{'en': 'Unsupervised Sentence-embeddings by Manifold Approximation and Projection', 'ar': 'زخرفة الجمل غير الخاضعة للإشراف بالتقريب والإسقاط المنوع', 'fr': 'Insertions de phrases non supervisées par approximation et projection multiples', 'es': 'Incorporación de oraciones no supervisada mediante aproximación y proyección múltiple', 'pt': 'Incorporações de sentenças não supervisionadas por aproximação e projeção de variedades', 'ru': 'Неконтролируемые предложения - вложения по приближению и проекции манифольда', 'zh': '流形近与投影者无监句嵌之', 'hi': 'कई गुना सन्निकटन और प्रक्षेपण द्वारा असुरक्षित वाक्य-embeddings', 'ja': 'マニホールドの近似と投影による監督なしの文章埋め込み', 'ga': 'Pianbhreithe Neamh-mhaoirsithe-leabú trí Chomhfhogasú agus Teilgean Iomadúla', 'ka': 'მანიფოლენტის მიღება და პროგექციის გამოყენება', 'hu': 'Felügyeletlen mondat-beágyazások többszörös közelítés és vetítés alapján', 'el': 'Μη εποπτευόμενες ενσωμάτωση των προτάσεων με πολλαπλή προσέγγιση και προβολή', 'it': 'Incorporazioni di frasi non sorvegliate per approssimazione e proiezione di collettori', 'kk': 'Манифолды жақсарту және жобалар бойынша қолданылмаған сөзді ендіру', 'mk': 'Unsupervised Sentence-embeddings by Manifold Approximation and Projection', 'lt': 'Neprižiūrimas bausmės įtraukimas pagal daugialypį suderinimą ir projektavimą', 'ms': 'Pencampuran-hukuman tanpa pengawasan oleh Pendekatan dan Projeksi Berlipat-lipat', 'ml': 'മാനിഫോള്\u200dഡ് അപ്രോക്സിമേഷനും പദ്ധതി', 'mt': 'Inkorporazzjonijiet tas-Sentenzi mhux sorveljati mill-Approssimazzjoni u l-Proġettazzjoni Manipli', 'no': 'Ikkje oppretta setningar med fleire tilnærming og prosjekt', 'mn': 'Манифлод ойлголт болон төсөөлөлт', 'ro': 'Încorporarea sentințelor nesupravegheate prin apropiere și proiecție multiplă', 'pl': 'Niemonitorowane osadzenia zdań przez wielokrotne zbliżenie i projekcje', 'sr': 'Neobezbeðeni prikljuèeni prikljuèeni i projekciji', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Xukummada aan ilaalinayn ee Manifold Approximation iyo Projection', 'sv': 'Oservörda meningsinbäddningar genom tillnärmning och projektion', 'ur': 'مختلف تقریبا اور تقریبا کے ذریعہ بغیر محفوظ سنت-انڈینگ', 'ta': 'கண்காணிக்கப்படாத வாக்குறிப்புகள்', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Biên bản chưa được kiểm soát qua Duyệt Ý định', 'da': 'Ikke-overvågede sætningsindlejringer efter manifold tilnærmelse og projektion', 'nl': 'Onbewaakte zinsinsluitingen door veelvoudige benadering en projectie', 'bg': 'Неконтролирано вграждане на присъди чрез колективно приближаване и проекция', 'hr': 'Neodređene približavanje i projekcije', 'de': 'Unservised Satz-Einbettungen durch Manifold Approximation und Projektion', 'id': 'Penyerangan-hukuman yang tidak diawasi oleh Pendekatan dan Projeksi Berlipat-lipat', 'fa': 'توسط تقریبا و پروژه\u200cهای مختلف سخنرانی غیر محافظت', 'tr': 'Manifold Ta첵첵arlama we Ta첵첵arlama', 'sw': 'Matukio yasiyopangwa na Manifold Kuonyesha na Mradi wa Manifold', 'af': 'Onondersteunde woord- inbêring deur manifolde besondering en verwerking', 'sq': 'Ndryshimet e padukshme të dënimeve nga afrimi dhe projektimi i shumëfishtë', 'hy': 'Բազմազան մոտեցման և պրոեկցիայի միջոցով անվերահսկված նախադասություններ', 'am': 'ቦታ', 'bs': 'Neobezbeđeni priključenje i proglašenje izraza', 'az': 'Müxtəlif Yaxınlaşdırma və Proqramma vasitəsilə müəyyən edilməmiş Sözü', 'bn': 'ম্যানিফোল্ড অ্যাপ্রোক্সিমেশন এবং প্রকল্পের দ্বারা শাস্তি অনুসরণ করা হয় না', 'ko': '유형 접근과 투영을 바탕으로 하는 무감독 문장 삽입', 'ca': 'Incorporacions sense supervisió de sentences per aproximació i projectió múltiples', 'cs': 'Nehlídané vložení vět pomocí rozmanité aproximace a projekce', 'et': 'Järelevalveta lausete manustamine kollektiivse lähenemise ja prognoosi järgi', 'fi': 'Valvontattomat lauseiden upotukset moniulotteisen lähestymisen ja projisoinnin avulla', 'he': 'Unsupervised Sentence-embeddings by Manifold Approximation and Projection', 'ha': 'Media controller element', 'jv': 'Strikethrough <\\.\\.\\.>', 'sk': 'Nenadzorovane stavke z množično približevanje in projekcijo', 'bo': 'Manifold་སྒྲིག་དང་མཐུན་རྗེས་ལ་བསྟུན་ནས་སྐྱོད་མེད་པའི་ཚིག་རྣམ་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'The concept of unsupervised universal sentence encoders has gained traction recently, wherein pre-trained models generate effective task-agnostic fixed-dimensional representations for phrases, sentences and paragraphs. Such methods are of varying complexity, from simple weighted-averages of word vectors to complex language-models based on bidirectional transformers. In this work we propose a novel technique to generate sentence-embeddings in an unsupervised fashion by projecting the sentences onto a fixed-dimensional manifold with the objective of preserving local neighbourhoods in the original space. To delineate such neighbourhoods we experiment with several set-distance metrics, including the recently proposed Word Mover’s distance, while the fixed-dimensional projection is achieved by employing a scalable and efficient manifold approximation method rooted in topological data analysis. We test our approach, which we term EMAP or Embeddings by Manifold Approximation and Projection, on six publicly available text-classification datasets of varying size and complexity. Empirical results show that our method consistently performs similar to or better than several alternative state-of-the-art approaches.', 'es': 'El concepto de codificadores universales de oraciones no supervisados ha ganado fuerza recientemente, en el que los modelos previamente entrenados generan representaciones de dimensiones fijas eficaces e independientes de la tarea para frases, oraciones y párrafos. Dichos métodos son de complejidad variable, desde promedios ponderados simples de vectores de palabras hasta modelos de lenguaje complejos basados en transformadores bidireccionales. En este trabajo proponemos una técnica novedosa para generar incrustaciones de oraciones de manera no supervisada mediante la proyección de las oraciones en una variedad de dimensiones fijas con el objetivo de preservar los barrios locales en el espacio original. Para delinear estos vecindarios, experimentamos con varias métricas de distancia establecida, incluida la distancia de Word Mover recientemente propuesta, mientras que la proyección de dimensión fija se logra mediante el empleo de un método de aproximación múltiple escalable y eficiente basado en el análisis de datos topológicos. Probamos nuestro enfoque, que denominamos EMAP o Embeddings by Manifold Approximation and Projection, en seis conjuntos de datos de clasificación de textos disponibles públicamente de diferente tamaño y complejidad. Los resultados empíricos muestran que nuestro método funciona consistentemente de manera similar o mejor que varios enfoques alternativos de última generación.', 'fr': "Le concept de codeurs de phrases universels non supervisés a récemment gagné en popularité, les modèles préentraînés générant des représentations dimensionnelles fixes indépendantes de la tâche pour les phrases, les phrases et les paragraphes. Ces méthodes sont d'une complexité variable, allant de simples moyennes pondérées de vecteurs de mots à des modèles de langage complexes basés sur des transformateurs bidirectionnels. Dans ce travail, nous proposons une nouvelle technique pour générer des incrustations de phrases de manière non supervisée en projetant les phrases sur un multiple dimensionnel fixe dans le but de préserver les quartiers locaux dans l'espace d'origine. Pour délimiter de tels quartiers, nous expérimentons plusieurs mesures de distance définie, y compris la distance de Word Mover récemment proposée, tandis que la projection à dimension fixe est réalisée en utilisant une méthode d'approximation multiple évolutive et efficace enracinée dans l'analyse de données topologiques. Nous testons notre approche, que nous appelons EMAP ou Embeddings by Manifold Approximation and Projection, sur six ensembles de données de classification de texte accessibles au public de taille et de complexité variables. Les résultats empiriques montrent que notre méthode fonctionne toujours de manière similaire ou supérieure à plusieurs approches de pointe alternatives.", 'pt': 'O conceito de codificadores de frases universais não supervisionados ganhou força recentemente, em que modelos pré-treinados geram representações dimensionais fixas independentes de tarefa eficazes para frases, sentenças e parágrafos. Tais métodos são de complexidade variável, desde simples médias ponderadas de vetores de palavras até modelos de linguagem complexos baseados em transformadores bidirecionais. Neste trabalho, propomos uma nova técnica para gerar embeddings de sentenças de forma não supervisionada, projetando as sentenças em uma variedade de dimensão fixa com o objetivo de preservar vizinhanças locais no espaço original. Para delinear tais vizinhanças, experimentamos várias métricas de distância de conjunto, incluindo a distância do Word Mover, proposta recentemente, enquanto a projeção de dimensão fixa é alcançada empregando um método de aproximação de variedade escalável e eficiente baseado em análise de dados topológicos. Testamos nossa abordagem, que chamamos de EMAP ou Embeddings por Aproximação e Projeção de Manifold, em seis conjuntos de dados de classificação de texto disponíveis publicamente de tamanho e complexidade variados. Os resultados empíricos mostram que nosso método tem um desempenho consistentemente semelhante ou melhor do que várias abordagens alternativas de última geração.', 'zh': '无监编码器之名近得牵引力,其先训者为短语,句段落有效者无关维度。 其法有不同之复杂性,从词向量之简加权平均值至于双向转换器之杂言。 于此一新,投句于维流形,以无监生句嵌之,在原始空间中存局邻域。 为画此邻域,试数定距指标,及近Word Mover之去,而定维投影,因植根于拓扑数据分析而广高效流形近似之法。 余于六大小与复杂性公文本分类数据集上试之,谓之EMAP、流形近、投影之嵌。 经验结果表明,吾法终与数代最先进者相似更善。', 'hi': 'असुरक्षित सार्वभौमिक वाक्य एन्कोडर की अवधारणा ने हाल ही में कर्षण प्राप्त किया है, जिसमें पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित मॉडल वाक्यांशों, वाक्यों और पैराग्राफ के लिए प्रभावी कार्य-अज्ञेयवादी निश्चित-आयामी प्रतिनिधित्व उत्पन्न करते हैं। इस तरह के तरीके अलग-अलग जटिलता के होते हैं, शब्द वैक्टर के सरल भारित-औसत से लेकर द्विदिश ट्रांसफार्मर के आधार पर जटिल भाषा-मॉडल तक। इस काम में हम मूल स्थान में स्थानीय पड़ोस को संरक्षित करने के उद्देश्य से वाक्यों को एक निश्चित-आयामी कई गुना पर प्रोजेक्ट करके एक असुरक्षित फैशन में वाक्य-एम्बेडिंग उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक उपन्यास तकनीक का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। इस तरह के पड़ोस को चित्रित करने के लिए हम हाल ही में प्रस्तावित वर्ड मूवर की दूरी सहित कई सेट-डिस्टेंस मीट्रिक के साथ प्रयोग करते हैं, जबकि निश्चित-आयामी प्रक्षेपण टोपोलॉजिकल डेटा विश्लेषण में निहित एक स्केलेबल और कुशल कई गुना सन्निकटन विधि को नियोजित करके प्राप्त किया जाता है। हम अपने दृष्टिकोण का परीक्षण करते हैं, जिसे हम अलग-अलग आकार और जटिलता के छह सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध पाठ-वर्गीकरण डेटासेट पर कई गुना सन्निकटन और प्रोजेक्शन द्वारा EMAP या एम्बेडिंग कहते हैं। अनुभवजन्य परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारी विधि लगातार कई वैकल्पिक अत्याधुनिक दृष्टिकोणों के समान या बेहतर प्रदर्शन करती है।', 'ru': 'В последнее время получила распространение концепция неконтролируемых универсальных кодировщиков предложений, в рамках которой предварительно обученные модели генерируют эффективные постановки задач - диагностические фиксированные размерные представления для фраз, предложений и абзацев. Такие методы имеют различную сложность, от простых средневзвешенных словесных векторов до сложных языковых моделей, основанных на двунаправленных трансформаторах. В этой работе мы предлагаем новую технику генерации заключений предложений неконтролируемым образом, проецируя предложения на фиксированный размерный манифольд с целью сохранения местных кварталов в исходном пространстве. Чтобы разграничить такие районы, мы экспериментируем с несколькими метриками заданного расстояния, включая недавно предложенное расстояние Word Mover, в то время как фиксированная проекция достигается с помощью масштабируемого и эффективного метода многократного приближения, основанного на анализе топологических данных. Мы тестируем наш подход, который мы называем EMAP или Embeddings by Manifold Approximation and Projection, на шести общедоступных наборах данных текстовой классификации различного размера и сложности. Эмпирические результаты показывают, что наш метод последовательно работает аналогично или лучше, чем несколько альтернативных современных подходов.', 'ga': 'Tháinig tarraingt ar choincheap na n-ionchódóirí abairtí uilíocha gan mhaoirseacht le déanaí, ina ngineann samhlacha réamhoilte uiríll éifeachtúla tasc-agnóiseacha tríthoiseacha seasta d’fhrásaí, abairtí agus ailt. Tá castacht éagsúil ag baint le modhanna den sórt sin, ó mheánmhéideanna simplí ualaithe veicteoirí focal go samhlacha casta teanga bunaithe ar chlaochladáin déthreocha. Sa saothar seo molaimid teicníocht úrnua chun leabú abairtí a ghiniúint ar bhealach gan mhaoirseacht trí na habairtí a theilgean ar iomadúil tríthoiseach seasta leis an gcuspóir comharsanachtaí áitiúla a chaomhnú sa spás bunaidh. Chun comharsanachtaí dá leithéid a shainiú déanaimid triail le roinnt méadracht tacair, lena n-áirítear fad Word Mover a moladh le déanaí, agus baintear amach an réamh-mheastachán tríthoiseach seasta trí úsáid a bhaint as modh comhfhogasaithe inscálaithe éifeachtach atá fréamhaithe in anailís toipeolaíoch ar shonraí. Déanaimid tástáil ar ár gcur chuige, ar a dtugaimid EMAP nó Leabú trí Chomhfhogasú agus Teilgean Iomadúla, ar shé thacar sonraí rangaithe téacs atá ar fáil go poiblí de mhéideanna agus de chastacht éagsúla. Léiríonn torthaí eimpíreacha go bhfeidhmíonn ár modh go seasta cosúil le nó níos fearr ná roinnt cineálacha cur chuige úrscothach.', 'ar': 'اكتسب مفهوم مشفرات الجملة العالمية غير الخاضعة للرقابة قوة جذب مؤخرًا ، حيث تولد النماذج المدربة مسبقًا تمثيلات فعالة ذات أبعاد ثابتة وغير محددة للمهام للعبارات والجمل والفقرات. هذه الأساليب متفاوتة التعقيد ، من المتوسطات الموزونة البسيطة لمتجهات الكلمات إلى نماذج اللغة المعقدة القائمة على المحولات ثنائية الاتجاه. في هذا العمل ، نقترح تقنية جديدة لتوليد زخارف الجمل بطريقة غير خاضعة للرقابة من خلال إسقاط الجمل على مشعب ثابت الأبعاد بهدف الحفاظ على الأحياء المحلية في الفضاء الأصلي. لتحديد هذه الأحياء ، نجرب العديد من مقاييس المسافة المحددة ، بما في ذلك مسافة Word Mover المقترحة مؤخرًا ، بينما يتم تحقيق الإسقاط ذو الأبعاد الثابتة من خلال استخدام طريقة تقريب متعددة قابلة للتطوير وفعالة متجذرة في تحليل البيانات الطوبولوجية. نحن نختبر نهجنا ، الذي نطلق عليه اسم EMAP أو Embeddings by Manifold Approximation and Projection ، على ست مجموعات بيانات تصنيف نصية متاحة للجمهور ومتفاوتة الحجم والتعقيد. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن طريقتنا تؤدي باستمرار أداءً مشابهًا أو أفضل من العديد من الأساليب البديلة الحديثة.', 'ja': '監視されていない普遍的な文章エンコーダの概念は、事前に訓練されたモデルが、フレーズ、文章、およびパラグラフのための効果的なタスク非依存の固定次元表現を生成することで、最近牽引力を得ている。 そのような方法は、単純なワードベクトルの加重平均から、双方向変換器に基づく複雑な言語モデルまで、さまざまな複雑さのものである。 この作品では、元の空間のローカルなエリアを保存することを目的に、文を固定された次元のマニホールドに投影することによって、監督されていない方法で文の埋め込みを生成する新しいテクニックを提案しています。 そのような近傍を描写するために、私たちは、最近提案されたWord Moverの距離を含むいくつかの設定距離メトリックを実験し、固定次元投影は、トポロジーデータ分析に根ざしたスケーラブルで効率的なマニホールド近似法を使用することによって達成される。 私たちは、さまざまなサイズと複雑さの6つの公開されているテキスト分類データセットで、EMAPまたはマニホールド近似および投影による埋め込みと呼ばれるアプローチをテストします。 実証結果は、私たちの方法がいくつかの最先端の代替アプローチと同様またはそれよりも一貫して優れたパフォーマンスを発揮することを示しています。', 'ka': 'არაფერიზებული სამუშაო სიტყვების კოდენტიფიკაციის კოდენტიფიკაცია ახლა მიიღეთ ტრაქცია, სიტყვები და პარაგრაფიების შესახებ, რომლებიც სამუშაო მოდელები იქნება ეფექტიური საქმე ასეთი მეტოვები განსხვავებული კომპლექსიტების განსხვავება, სიტყვების განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავებების განსხვავება, რომელიც კომპ ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ პროგრამეტური ტექნექცია, რომელიც წარმოიდგინეთ სიტყვების შექმნის შექმნის განსხვავებული ფორმაში, რომელიც წარმოიდგინეთ სიტყვები განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავ ამ საზოგადოების განსაზღვრებისთვის, ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტირებთ რამდენიმე განსაზღვრებული მეტრიკით, როგორც ახლა მოძრაობული სიტყვის მოძრაობის განმავლობაში, მაგრამ განსაზღვრებული განსაზღვრებული პროექცია მიიღება მანქალ ჩვენ შევცვალობთ ჩვენი წარმოდგენა, რომელიც ჩვენ EMAP-ს ან დავყენებას მანფოლდის წარმოდგენებით და პროექტირებაზე, ქვსჯერ ადამიანურად ხელმისაწარმოდგენებული ტექსტიკლისფიკა თმორიკალური წარმოდგენები ჩვენი მეთოდის შემდეგ გავაკეთება რამდენიმე ალტენტრუმენტური სტატრუმენტის შემდეგ.', 'it': "Il concetto di codificatori universali di frasi non supervisionati ha guadagnato vigore recentemente, in cui modelli pre-addestrati generano efficaci rappresentazioni dimensionali fisse agnostiche per frasi, frasi e paragrafi. Tali metodi sono di varia complessità, da semplici medie ponderate di vettori di parole a complessi modelli di linguaggio basati su trasformatori bidirezionali. In questo lavoro proponiamo una nuova tecnica per generare embedding di frasi in modo non supervisionato proiettando le frasi su un multiplo dimensionale fisso con l'obiettivo di preservare i quartieri locali nello spazio originale. Per delineare questi quartieri sperimentiamo diverse metriche di distanza set, tra cui la distanza di Word Mover recentemente proposta, mentre la proiezione dimensionale fissa è ottenuta utilizzando un metodo di approssimazione scalabile ed efficiente basato sull'analisi topologica dei dati. Testiamo il nostro approccio, che chiamiamo EMAP o Embeddings by Manifold Approximation and Projection, su sei set di dati di classificazione testuale pubblicamente disponibili di dimensioni e complessità variabili. I risultati empirici mostrano che il nostro metodo funziona costantemente simile o meglio di diversi approcci alternativi all'avanguardia.", 'el': 'Η έννοια των καθολικών κωδικοποιητών προτάσεων χωρίς επίβλεψη έχει αποκτήσει προσφάτως έλξη, όπου τα προ-εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα παράγουν αποτελεσματικές αναπαραστάσεις σταθερής διάστασης για φράσεις, προτάσεις και παραγράφους. Τέτοιες μέθοδοι είναι ποικίλης πολυπλοκότητας, από απλούς σταθμισμένους μέσους όρους διανύσματος λέξεων έως σύνθετα γλωσσικά μοντέλα βασισμένα σε αμφίδρομους μετασχηματιστές. Στην παρούσα εργασία προτείνουμε μια νέα τεχνική για την παραγωγή ενσάρκωσης προτάσεων χωρίς επίβλεψη προβάλλοντας τις προτάσεις σε μια πολλαπλότητα σταθερής διάστασης με στόχο τη διατήρηση των τοπικών γειτονιών στον αρχικό χώρο. Για την οριοθεσία τέτοιων γειτονιών πειραματιζόμαστε με αρκετές μετρήσεις καθορισμένης απόστασης, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της απόστασης που προτείνεται πρόσφατα, ενώ η προβολή σταθερής διάστασης επιτυγχάνεται χρησιμοποιώντας μια κλιμακωτή και αποδοτική μέθοδο πολλαπλής προσέγγισης ριζωμένη στην ανάλυση τοπολογικών δεδομένων. Δοκιμάζουμε την προσέγγισή μας, την οποία ονομάζουμε ΕΜAP ή Ενσωματώσεις με πολλαπλή προσέγγιση και προβολή, σε έξι δημόσια διαθέσιμα σύνολα δεδομένων ταξινόμησης κειμένου διαφορετικού μεγέθους και πολυπλοκότητας. Τα εμπειρικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας αποδίδει σταθερά παρόμοια ή καλύτερη από πολλές εναλλακτικές προσεγγίσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας.', 'hu': 'A felügyelet nélküli univerzális mondatkódolók koncepciója a közelmúltban megnyerte a vonzódást, ahol az előkészített modellek hatékony feladat-agnosztikus fix dimenziós ábrázolásokat generálnak kifejezésekhez, mondatokhoz és bekezdésekhez. Az ilyen módszerek különböző összetettségűek, a szóvektorok egyszerű súlyozott átlagától a kétirányú transzformátorokon alapuló komplex nyelvmodellekig. Ebben a munkában olyan új technikát javasolunk, amely felügyelet nélkül hozza létre a mondatok beágyazását, a mondatokat rögzített dimenziós sokaságra vetítve, azzal a céllal, hogy megőrizze a helyi környékeket az eredeti térben. Az ilyen környékek körvonalazásához több set-distance metrikával kísérletezünk, beleértve a nemrégiben javasolt Word Mover távolságát, míg a fix dimenziós vetítést egy topológiai adatelemzésben gyökerező skálázható és hatékony sokféle approximációs módszer alkalmazásával érjük el. Megközelítésünket, amelyet EMAP-nek vagy Embeddings by Multifold Approximation and Projection-nek nevezünk, hat nyilvánosan elérhető, különböző méretű és bonyolult szövegosztályozási adatkészleten teszteljük. Az empirikus eredmények azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk következetesen hasonló vagy jobban teljesít, mint több alternatív korszerű megközelítés.', 'lt': 'The concept of unsupervised universal sentence encoders has gained traction recently, wherein pre-trained models generate effective task-agnostic fixed-dimensional representations for phrases, sentences and paragraphs.  Tokie metodai skiriasi nuo paprastų svertinių žodžių vektorių vidurkių iki sudėtingų kalbų modelių, grindžiamų dvikryptiniais transformatoriais. In this work we propose a novel technique to generate sentence-embeddings in an unsupervised fashion by projecting the sentences onto a fixed-dimensional manifold with the objective of preserving local neighbourhoods in the original space.  Siekiant apibrėžti tokius rajonus, eksperimentuojame su keliomis nustatyto atstumo metrijomis, įskaitant neseniai pasiūlytą žodžių judiklio atstumą, o fiksuoto matmens projekcija pasiekiama taikant topologinėje duomenų analizėje pagrįstą skaliuojamą ir efektyvų daugelio derinimo metodą. We test our approach, which we term EMAP or Embeddings by Manifold Approximation and Projection, on six publicly available text-classification datasets of varying size and complexity.  Imperijos rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų metodas nuosekliai veikia panašiai arba geriau nei keli naujausi alternatyvūs metodai.', 'kk': 'Жуырдағы мәліметтің кодтарының концепциясы жаңа қадамдастырылған, жұмыс ішінде оқылған үлгілердің эффективні тапсырма- агностикалық бөлшекті мәліметтер, сөйлемелер мен параграфлар үшін тапсырма-  Бұл әдістер бірнеше тәжірибелікті түрлендіруінің кәдімгі векторлардың орташасынан, бірнеше тәжірибелікті түрлендірушілеріне негізделген комплекс тіл үлгілеріне Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз сөздерді бағытталмаған тәртіпке қолдану үшін романдық техникалық түрде сөздерді бағытталмаған тәртіпсіздік көпшілікті түрлі бос орындағы жергілікті қоршау мақсатымен сақтау үшін қолданамыз. Бұл көшелерді бөлістіру үшін бірнеше бөлікті метрикамен тәжірибедік, соңғы таңдалған Word Mover- тың қашықтығын қоса, бірақ бөлікті проекциясы топологиялық деректердің анализиясында масштабтау және эффективні көшелеу әдісі Біз өзіміздің тәсілімізді тексереміз. Бұл көптеген көптеген өлшемі мен тәжірибеліктердің алты жалпы мәтін классификациялау деректер жиындарында EMAP не Ендіріміз деп аталады. Эмпериялық нәтижелер біздің әдіміміз бірнеше альтернативті орындау күйіне ұқсас немесе жақсы жұмыс істейтінін көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Концептот на ненадгледувани универзални кодери на реченици неодамна доби тракција, во која предобучените модели генерираат ефикасни задачи-агностички фиксно-димензионални претставувања за фрази, реченици и параграфии. Таквите методи се од различна комплексност, од едноставни тежирани просечни вектори на зборови до комплексни јазички модели базирани на двојно насоки трансформатори. In this work we propose a novel technique to generate sentence-embeddings in an unsupervised fashion by projecting the sentences onto a fixed-dimensional manifold with the objective of preserving local neighbourhoods in the original space.  За да ги дефинираме ваквите соседи експериментираме со неколку метрики на оддалеченост, вклучувајќи ја и неодамна предложената оддалеченост на Word Mover, додека фиксна-димензионалната проекција се постигнува со употреба на скалиран и ефикасен множина метод на приближување коренет во топологичката анализа на Ние го тестираме нашиот пристап, кој го нарекуваме EMAP или Embeddings by Manifold Approximation and Projection, на шест јавно достапни текстови класификациски податоци од различна големина и комплексност. Империските резултати покажуваат дека нашиот метод постојано функционира слично или подобро од неколку алтернативни најдобри пристапи.', 'ms': 'Konsep pengekod kalimat universal tidak diawasi telah mendapat traksi baru-baru ini, di mana model pralatihan menghasilkan perwakilan tugas-agnostik dimensi-tetap yang berkesan untuk frasa, kalimat dan paragraf. Kaedah-kaedah ini adalah kompleksiti yang berbeza, dari rata-rata-berat mudah vektor perkataan kepada model bahasa kompleks berdasarkan pengubah bidireksi. In this work we propose a novel technique to generate sentence-embeddings in an unsupervised fashion by projecting the sentences onto a fixed-dimensional manifold with the objective of preserving local neighbourhoods in the original space.  Untuk membatasi kawasan-kawasan tersebut, kami eksperimen dengan beberapa metrik set-jarak, termasuk jarak Word Mover yang baru-baru ini dilaporkan, sementara projeksi-dimensi tetap dicapai dengan menggunakan kaedah pendekatan berkembang yang boleh skala dan efisien berdasarkan analisis data topologi. Kami menguji pendekatan kami, yang kami sebutkan EMAP atau Embeddings oleh Pendekatan dan Projeksi Berlipat-lipat, pada enam set data kelasukan teks yang tersedia secara umum yang berbeza saiz dan kompleksiti. Empirical results show that our method consistently performs similar to or better than several alternative state-of-the-art approaches.', 'ml': 'സംരക്ഷിക്കാത്ത പൊതുവാക്കുകളുടെ ആശയം അടുത്തുതന്നെ ട്രാക്ഷന്\u200d ലഭ്യമായി ഇതുപോലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും സാധാരണ വാക്ക് വെക്റ്ററുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളിലേക്കുള്ള ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ടെക്നിക്ക് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. വാക്കുകള്\u200d സംരക്ഷിക്കുന്നത് സൂക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത രീതിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d  ഇതുപോലുള്ള അയല്\u200dക്കാര്\u200dക്ക് നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d പല സെറ്റ് ദൂരം മെട്രിക്കളുമായി പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. അടുത്തുതന്നെ വാക്ക് മോവറിന്റെ ദൂരം ചേര്\u200dന്നിരിക്ക ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സമ്പ്രദായം പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു, മാനിഫോള്\u200dഡ് അപ്രോക്സിമേഷനും പ്രോജക്റ്റേഷനുമായി നമ്മുടെ എമ്പിയോ എമ്പിഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d എന്നിവയ Empirical results show that our method consistently performs similar to or better than several alternative state-of-the-art approaches.', 'mt': "Il-kunċett ta’ kodifikaturi tas-sentenzi universali mhux sorveljati reċentement kiseb trazzjoni, fejn mudelli mħarrġa minn qabel jiġġeneraw rappreżentazzjonijiet effettivi b’dimensjoni fissa tal-kompiti għal frażijiet, sentenzi u paragrafi. Tali metodi huma ta’ kumplessità varjata, minn medja ppeżata sempliċi ta’ vetturi tal-kliem għal mudelli lingwistiċi kumplessi bbażati fuq trasformaturi bidirezzjonali. In this work we propose a novel technique to generate sentence-embeddings in an unsupervised fashion by projecting the sentences onto a fixed-dimensional manifold with the objective of preserving local neighbourhoods in the original space.  Biex niddefinixxu viċinat bħal dan, a ħna qed ninsperimentaw b'diversi metriċi ta' distanza fissa, inkluż id-distanza tal-Word Mover proposta reċentement, filwaqt li l-projezzjoni fissa-dimensjonali tinkiseb bl-użu ta' metodu ta' approssimazzjoni multipla skalabbli u effiċjenti għeruq fl-analiżi tad-dejta topoloġika. Aħna nistestjaw l-approċċ tagħna, li aħna nitkellmu EMAP jew Embeddings permezz ta’ Approssimazzjoni u Proġettazzjoni Manipli, fuq sitt settijiet ta’ dejta disponibbli għall-klassifikazzjoni tat-test ta’ daqs u kumplessità differenti. Empirical results show that our method consistently performs similar to or better than several alternative state-of-the-art approaches.", 'pl': 'Koncepcja uniwersalnych koderów zdań bez nadzoru zyskała ostatnio wzrost popularności, w których wstępnie przeszkolone modele generują skuteczne zadaniowo-agnostyczne stałymiarowe reprezentacje zwrotów, zdań i akapitów. Metody te mają różną złożoność, od prostych średnich ważonych wektorów słowa po złożone modele językowe oparte na transformatorach dwukierunkowych. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy nowatorską technikę generowania osadzeń zdań w sposób bez nadzoru poprzez projekcję zdań na kolektor stało-wymiarowy w celu zachowania lokalnych dzielnic w oryginalnej przestrzeni. Aby wyznaczyć takie dzielnice eksperymentujemy z kilkoma wskaźnikami odległości zestawu, w tym z niedawno zaproponowaną odległością Word Movera, podczas gdy projekcja stało-wymiarowa jest osiągana poprzez zastosowanie skalowalnej i wydajnej metody przybliżenia wielokrotnego zakorzenionej w analizie danych topologicznych. Nasze podejście, które nazywamy EMAP lub Embeddings by Manifold Approximation and Projection, testujemy na sześciu publicznie dostępnych zbiorach danych klasyfikacji tekstów o różnej wielkości i złożoności. Wyniki empiryczne pokazują, że nasza metoda konsekwentnie działa podobnie lub lepiej niż kilka alternatywnych najnowocześniejszych metod.', 'mn': 'Өмнөх сургалтын шинжлэх ухааны шинжлэх ухаан нь саяхан дасгал шинжлэх ухаан авч ирсэн. Эхлээд сургалтын загварууд хэлбэрүүд, өгүүлбэрүүд болон графиктуудын тусламжтай ажил-агностик тогтмол хэмжээст хэ Ийм төрлийн арга нь энгийн жингийн дундаж хэлний векторуудын төвөгтэй хэл загваруудын төвөгтэй төвөгтэй хэл загваруудыг өөрчлөх юм. Энэ ажлын тулд бид өгүүлбэрийг тодорхой хэмжээст хэмжээст хэмжээст хуваалцах зорилго дээр шинэ техник бий болгодог. Эдгээр хөршүүдийг тодорхойлохын тулд бид олон төрлийн зай метрикийг туршиж, саяхан санал дэвшүүлсэн Word Mover-ын зай болон тоопологийн өгөгдлийн шинжилгээнд суурилсан хэмжээст төлөвлөгөө ашиглаж чадна. Бид өөр хэмжээний, төвөгтэй байдлын зургаан олон нийтэд тайлбарлах өгөгдлийн хэмжээний хэлбэрээр EMAP эсвэл нэвтрүүлэх арга замыг шалгаж үздэг. Эзэвсгийн үр дүнд бидний арга нь олон альтернатив урлагийн тусламжтай ижил эсвэл илүү сайн ажилладаг гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය වාර්තාවික කෝඩාර්ස් ගැන අනුපුරුද්ධ වාර්තාවක් අවස්ථාවක් ලැබුනා තියෙනවා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ මේ විදියට වෙනස් විදියට වෙනස් විදියට, වෙක්ටර් වලගේ සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට වෙනස් විදියට වෙනස් විදියට වෙනස් විදියට පත මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වාර්තාව නැති ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා වචන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න පුළ අනිවාර්ය සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් අපි පරීක්ෂා කරනවා සෙට් දුරස්ථානය මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් එක්ක, අවස්ථානයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ වාර්ථ විශ්ලේෂණයේ ද අපි පරීක්ෂා කරනවා අපේ විවිධ ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ පරික්ෂණය සඳහා EMAP නැත්තම් ඇම්බෙඩින්ග් වලින් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dර අධ්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විදියට සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට සමාන්\u200dය විදියට සහ හෝදරයෙන් වෙනස් වෙනස්', 'ro': 'Conceptul de codificatoare universale de propoziții nesupravegheate a câștigat tracțiune recent, în care modele pre-instruite generează reprezentări eficiente agnostice fixe dimensionale pentru fraze, propoziții și paragrafe. Astfel de metode sunt de complexitate variată, de la medii ponderate simple ale vectorilor de cuvinte la modele lingvistice complexe bazate pe transformatoare bidirecționale. În această lucrare propunem o tehnică nouă de generare a încorporărilor de propoziții într-o manieră nesupravegheată prin proiectarea propozițiilor pe o multitudine dimensională fixă, cu scopul de a păstra cartierele locale în spațiul original. Pentru a delimita astfel de cartiere experimentăm mai multe măsurători de distanță setată, inclusiv distanța propusă recent Word Mover, în timp ce proiecția dimensională fixă este realizată prin utilizarea unei metode scalabile și eficiente de aproximare multiplă înrădăcinată în analiza datelor topologice. Testăm abordarea noastră, pe care o numim EMAP sau Embeddings by Multifold Approximation and Projection, pe șase seturi de date de clasificare a textelor disponibile public, de dimensiuni și complexitate diferite. Rezultatele empirice arată că metoda noastră performează în mod constant similar sau mai bine decât mai multe abordări alternative de ultimă generație.', 'sr': 'Koncept neodređenog univerzalnog kodera rečenice nedavno je dobio traku, u kojem predobučeni modeli stvaraju efikasne reprezentacije zadatka-agnostičke fiksnodimenzionalne rečenice, rečenice i paragrafe. Takve metode su različite kompleksnosti, od jednostavnih težinskih srednjih vektora do kompleksnih jezičkih modela na osnovu dvoričnih transformatora. U ovom poslu predlažemo novu tehniku da bi stvorili uvođenje rečenica na neodređeni način projekcijom rečenica na fiksno dimenzionalno mnogobrojno sa ciljem zaštite lokalne komšiluke u originalnom prostoru. Da bismo delinirali takve komšiluke, eksperimentirali smo s a nekoliko metrika za određenu udaljenost, uključujući nedavno predloženu udaljenost Word Mover-a, dok je fiksno dimenzionalna projekcija postignuta koristeći skalabilnu i efikasnu metodu prilagodbe korijenjenu u analizi topoloških podataka. Testiramo naš pristup, koji nazivamo EMAP ili uključujemo između različitih veličina i kompleksnosti, na šest javno dostupnih podataka za klasifikaciju teksta. Impirički rezultati pokazuju da naša metoda stalno izvodi sličnu ili bolju od nekoliko alternativnih pristupa umjetnosti.', 'so': 'Qoryaha xafiiska caalamiga ah ee aan la ilaalinayn waxay ugu dhowaan heleen dalab, kaas oo ay sameyn jireen tusaalooyin horay loo tababaray oo ay ka muujiyaan qayb faa’iido ah oo shaqo-agnostic-fixed-dimensions oo ku qoran hadallada, sentences iyo qeybaha. Wadamadaas oo kale waa dhibaatooyin kala duduwan, waxayna ka yimaadaan qiyaastii fudud ee hadalka iyo qaababka luuqada oo complex ah oo ku saleysan isbedelka qasabka ah. Shuqulkaas waxaynu soo jeedaynaa tekniko warqad ah si a an u sameyno qaab aan la ilaalinayn, si aan ugu qorno erayada uu ugu soo dejiyo nooc cayiman oo aad u baahan tahay in la ilaaliyo derisyada degmada ku yaala xafiiska asalka ah. Si aan u cadeyno degmooyinka caynkaas ah, waxaynu ku jirrabnaa meelo kala duwan oo safar ah, kuwaas oo ka mid ah meesha ugu dhowayd ee la soo jeeday hadal Mover, marka lagu soo gaadho baaritaanka cayimanta ah, si aad u baahan karto iyo faa’iido kala duduwan oo ku xigta baaritaanka sawirada. Waxaynu imtixaannaa hababka aan ku qorno EMAP ama safarka ee Manifold Approximation iyo Projection, waxaana ku qornaa lix koosaar macluumaad qoraal ah oo aad u muuqan karto oo aad u kala duduwan iyo aad u adag. Midhaha xiisaha ah waxay muuqataa in qaababkayagu uu si kamid ah u sameeyo ama ka fiican qaabilaada farshaxanka kala duwan.', 'ta': 'பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத பொது வாக்கிய குறியீடுகளின் கருத்து சமீபத்தில் கண்டுபிடிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, அதில் முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகள் வாக்கியங் இவ்வாறு முறைகள் மாறுதல்களை அடிப்படையில் சிக்கலான மாற்றங்களை அடிப்படையில் சிக்கலான மொழி மாதிரிகளுக்கு சிக்கலான மாதிரிகள இந்த வேலையில் நாம் ஒரு புதிய தொழில்நுட்பத்தை உருவாக்குவதற்கு பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் மூலத்தின் வாக்கியங்களை காப்பாற்றாத முறையில் வாக்கியங்களை நிறைவ இத்தகைய அண்டைகளை தீர்வு செய்ய நாம் சில அமைப்பு தூரம் மெட்ரிக்களுடன் சோதிக்கிறோம், சமீபத்தில் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட வார்த்தை மாற்றும் தூரத்துடன், நிறைவு பரிசோதிக்கப்பட்ட நாம் எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டை சோதிக்கிறோம், அதை நாம் மானிபோல் திட்டத்தின் மூலம் EMAP அல்லது Embeddings என்று கூறுகிறோம், ஆறு பொதுவாக க கிடைக்கும்  விருப்பமான முடிவுகள் காட்டுகிறது நம் முறைமையில் தொடர்ந்து அதைப் போன்ற அல்லது சிறப்பாக செயல்படுகிறது பல மாற்று கலை', 'sv': 'Begreppet oövervakade universella meningskoder har fått fäste på senare tid, där förkunskaperade modeller genererar effektiva uppgifts-agnostiska fasta dimensionella representationer för fraser, meningar och stycken. Sådana metoder är av varierande komplexitet, från enkla vägda medelvärden av ordvektorer till komplexa språkmodeller baserade på tvåriktade transformatorer. I detta arbete föreslår vi en ny teknik för att skapa meningsinbäddningar på ett obevakat sätt genom att projicera meningarna på ett fast dimensionellt mångfald med målet att bevara lokala stadsdelar i det ursprungliga rummet. För att definiera sådana områden experimenterar vi med flera mätvärden, inklusive den nyligen föreslagna Word Movers avstånd, medan den fasta dimensionella projektionen uppnås genom att använda en skalbar och effektiv mångfaldig approximationsmetod rotad i topologisk dataanalys. Vi testar vårt tillvägagångssätt, som vi kallar EMAP eller Embeddings by Manifold Approximation and Projection, på sex allmänt tillgängliga textklassificeringsdatauppsättningar av varierande storlek och komplexitet. Empiriska resultat visar att vår metod konsekvent presterar liknande eller bättre än flera alternativa state-of-the-art tillvägagångssätt.', 'ur': 'غیر قابل تعلیم کے واسطے یونلوسٹ وینلوسٹ وینلوسٹ کوڈر کی نظریہ اخیراً تراکشن حاصل کرتی ہے، جہاں پہلے تعلیم کی موڈل مفید کار-agnostic مضبوط اندازے کے مطابق فرشتوں، جماعتوں اور پراگراف کے لئے اثر یہ طریقے مختلف پیچیدگی کے لئے ہیں، کلمات ویکتروں کے ساده وزن میانہ سے پیچیدہ زبان-نمونڈل پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں. ہم اس کام میں ایک نئی تکنیک پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ مجلس-ایمبڈینگ کو بغیر محفوظ طریقے میں پیدا کریں اور مجلسوں کو ایک مقررہ اندازے کے مطابق مقررہ طریقے پر پیشنهاد کریں جو اصلی جگہ میں محیط محیط محیط حفاظت کریں۔ اس طرح کے گھر والوں کو تقسیم کرنے کے لئے ہم بہت سی سٹ-فاصلہ متریک کے ساتھ آزمائش کرتے ہیں، یہاں تک کہ اچھی طرح پیش کیا گیا ویڈ مویر کی فاصلہ کے ساتھ، حالانکہ ثابت اندازہ کی پروژیکشن پہنچ جاتی ہے کہ ایک مٹّیل اور عملکرد طریقے کے مطابق ایک مٹّی ہم اپنے طریقے کی آزمائش کرتے ہیں، جسے ہم مختلف اندازے اور پیچیدگی کے EMAP یا مہینڈنگ کے ذریعہ مہینڈنگ بناتے ہیں۔ امپراتیکی نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ ہمیشہ ایک طریقے سے بہتر یا بہتر عمل کرتا ہے۔', 'no': 'Koncepsjonen til universelle setkodar som ikkje er oppretta har fått spor nyleg, der først trengte modeller gjer effektiv oppgåve-agnostisk fiks-dimensjonal representasjonar for frasar, setningar og avsnitt. Desse metodane er av forskjellige kompleksitet, frå enkle vektegjennomsnitt av ordvektorar til komplekse språk-modeller basert på bidireksjonale transformatorar. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi eit nytt teknikk for å laga setningar i eit usynleg måte ved å prosjektera setningane på ein fiks-dimensjonal manifold med målet å lagra lokale naboer i den opprinnelige rommet. For å delegera slike nabolar, eksperimenterer vi med fleire settavstandsmeterikar, inkludert den nyleg foreslåde avstanden av Word Mover, mens den fiksne dimensjonale projeksjonen blir oppnådd ved å bruka ein skalerbar og effektiv metode for fleire ganger nærmingar rotert i topologiske dataanalyser. Vi tester tilnærminga vårt, som vi gjer EMAP eller innbygging av fleire tilnærmingar og prosjekt, på seks offentlig tilgjengelege tekstklassifikasjonsdata med ulike storleik og kompleksitet. Empiriske resultat viser at metoden vårt utfører konsistent liknande eller bedre enn fleire alternativ tilstand av kunsten nærmar.', 'uz': "Taʼminlovchi modellar soʻzlar, maxfiy soʻzlar, maxfiy soʻzlar va paragraphlar uchun ishlab chiqaradi. Such methods are of varying complexity, from simple weighted-averages of word vectors to complex language-models based on bidirectional transformers.  Bu vazifani biz bir novel teknologiya tahlil qilamiz, xavfsiz qilmagan usulda so'zlarni asl joyida saqlash uchun qo'llanmalarni bir necha tartib ko'paytirish mumkin. Bu kabi taqdimotlarni aniqlash uchun biz bir necha uzoqlar metriklari bilan tajriba qilamiz, eng yaqinda ilova qilingan so'zlar Movement orasidan masofadan ham ko'paytirish uchun qo'shimcha jarayonlarni topologik maʼlumot analysi bilan qo'llash va cheksiz ko'plab tarjima usulini ishlatish mumkin. Biz shunday qilamiz, biz Manifold Approximation va Projektning orqali EMAP yoki Emaillarni o'zgartiraymiz, o'zgarishning oʻlchami va murakkablik oʻlchami va qanchalik darajalashtirilgan lixda taʼlumotlar tarkibida. Empirik natijalari shunday ko'rsatadi, bizning usuli davomida bir necha boshqa shaxsiy narsalarning bir necha darajada ko'proq narsalarni bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Gần đây khái niệm mã hóa câu toàn cầu không được giám sát đã được chú ý, trong đó những mẫu được huấn luyện sẵn sàng tạo ra biểu tượng cố định-nét cho các cụm từ, câu và đoạn. Những phương pháp này có tính phức tạp khác nhau, từ trung bình chi quan trọng của các từ trung chuyển đến các mô hình ngôn ngữ phức tạp dựa trên biến đổi trực tiếp. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị một kỹ thuật mới để tạo ra sự cấy ghép bằng bản án theo một cách không giám sát bằng cách đưa câu nói vào một đa dạng cố định với mục đích bảo tồn các khu vực địa phương trong không gian ban đầu. Để mô tả những khu vực như thế, chúng tôi thử nghiệm với một s ố lượng tử cự ly, bao gồm cách xa của Từ Hành động Từ mới nhất, trong khi tiến hành trình chiếu không gian cố định được tạo ra bằng cách sử dụng một phương pháp áp dụng khả năng leo thang và hiệu quả Chúng tôi kiểm tra phương phạm này, chúng tôi gọi là một lời mở bằng được bản giao ảnh hướng theo một số một số giảng được bản thân bảo được. Các kết quả của công nghệ cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta hoàn to àn phù hợp với hoặc tốt hơn nhiều phương pháp hiện đại khác.', 'bg': 'Концепцията за ненадзорни универсални кодери на изречения придоби схващане напоследък, където предварително обучените модели генерират ефективни задачи агностични фиксирани измерения за фрази, изречения и абзаци. Такива методи са с различна сложност, от прости среднопретеглени стойности на словните вектори до сложни езикови модели, базирани на двупосочни трансформатори. В тази работа предлагаме нова техника за генериране на вграждания на изречения без надзор чрез прожектиране на изреченията върху фиксирано измерен колектор с цел запазване на местните квартали в първоначалното пространство. За да очертаем тези квартали, експериментираме с няколко метрика за зададено разстояние, включително наскоро предложеното разстояние, докато фиксираната проекция се постига чрез използване на мащабируем и ефективен метод за сближаване на колектори, коренен в топологичния анализ на данни. Изпробваме подхода си, който наричаме вграждания чрез многообразно приближаване и проекция, върху шест публично достъпни текстови класификационни набора данни с различен размер и сложност. Емпиричните резултати показват, че методът ни последователно изпълнява подобни или по-добри от няколко алтернативни съвременни подхода.', 'nl': "Het concept van universele zinnencoders zonder toezicht heeft recentelijk aan populariteit gewonnen, waarbij vooraf getrainde modellen effectieve taakagnostische vaste-dimensionale representaties voor zinnen, zinnen en alinea's genereren. Dergelijke methoden zijn van verschillende complexiteit, van eenvoudige gewogen gemiddelden van woordvectoren tot complexe taalmodellen gebaseerd op bidirectionele transformatoren. In dit werk stellen we een nieuwe techniek voor om zinsinbeddingen te genereren zonder toezicht door de zinnen te projecteren op een vast-dimensionale variëteit met als doel lokale buurten in de oorspronkelijke ruimte te behouden. Om dergelijke wijken af te bakenen experimenteren we met verschillende set-distance metrics, waaronder de recent voorgestelde afstand van Word Mover, terwijl de vaste-dimensionale projectie wordt bereikt door gebruik te maken van een schaalbare en efficiënte manifold approximation methode geworteld in topologische data analyse. We testen onze aanpak, die we EMAP of Embeddings by Manifold Approximation and Projection noemen, op zes publiekelijk beschikbare tekstclassificatiedatasets van verschillende grootte en complexiteit. Empirische resultaten tonen aan dat onze methode consistent vergelijkbaar of beter presteert dan verschillende alternatieve state-of-the-art benaderingen.", 'da': 'Begrebet uovervendte universelle sætningskodere har for nylig fået trækkraft, hvor prætrænede modeller genererer effektive opgaveagnostiske fastdimensionelle repræsentationer af sætninger, sætninger og afsnit. Sådanne metoder er af varierende kompleksitet, fra simple vægtede gennemsnit af ordvektorer til komplekse sprogmodeller baseret på tovejede transformatorer. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en ny teknik til at generere sætninger-indlejringer på en uopvåget måde ved at projicere sætningerne på en fast dimensionel mangfold med det formål at bevare lokale kvarterer i det oprindelige rum. For at afgrænse sådanne kvarterer eksperimenterer vi med flere sæt-distance metrics, herunder den nyligt foreslåede Word Movers afstand, mens den faste-dimensionelle projektion opnås ved at anvende en skalerbar og effektiv manifold approximation metode rodfæstet i topologisk dataanalyse. Vi tester vores tilgang, som vi kalder EMAP eller Embeddings by Manifold Approximation and Projection, på seks offentligt tilgængelige tekstklassifikationsdatasæt af varierende størrelse og kompleksitet. Empiriske resultater viser, at vores metode konsekvent fungerer som eller bedre end flere alternative state-of-the-art tilgange.', 'de': "Das Konzept der unbeaufsichtigten universellen Satzkodierer hat in letzter Zeit an Bedeutung gewonnen, wobei vortrainierte Modelle effektive aufgabenunabhängige, festdimensionale Darstellungen für Phrasen, Sätze und Absätze generieren. Solche Methoden sind von unterschiedlicher Komplexität, von einfachen gewichteten Mittelwerten von Wortvektoren bis hin zu komplexen Sprachmodellen, die auf bidirektionalen Transformatoren basieren. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir eine neuartige Technik vor, um Sätze-Einbettungen in einer unbeaufsichtigten Weise zu erzeugen, indem die Sätze auf eine fest-dimensionale Mannigfaltigkeit projiziert werden, mit dem Ziel, lokale Nachbarschaften im ursprünglichen Raum zu erhalten. Zur Abgrenzung solcher Nachbarschaften experimentieren wir mit mehreren Set-Distance-Metriken, einschließlich des kürzlich vorgeschlagenen Word Mover's distance, während die fix-dimensionale Projektion durch den Einsatz einer skalierbaren und effizienten mannigfaltigen Approximationsmethode erreicht wird, die auf topologischen Datenanalysen basiert. Wir testen unseren Ansatz, den wir EMAP oder Embeddings by Manifold Approximation and Projection nennen, an sechs öffentlich zugänglichen Textklassifizierungsdatensätzen unterschiedlicher Größe und Komplexität. Empirische Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unsere Methode durchweg ähnlich oder besser funktioniert als mehrere alternative State-of-the-Art Ansätze.", 'hr': 'Koncept neodređenih univerzalnih kodera rečenice nedavno je dobio praćenje, u kojem predobučeni modeli stvaraju učinkovite funkcionalne agnostičke fiksnodimenzionalne predstave fraze, rečenice i odstavke. Takve metode su različite kompleksnosti, od jednostavne težine prosječnih vektora riječi do kompleksnih jezičkih modela na temelju bidirektivnih transformatora. U ovom poslu predlažemo novu tehniku za stvaranje uvođenja rečenica na neodređen način projekcijom rečenica na fiksno dimenzionalno mnogobrojno s ciljem čuvanja lokalnih susjedstva u originalnom prostoru. Da bismo delinirali takve komšiluke, eksperimentirali smo s nekoliko metrika za određenu udaljenost, uključujući nedavno predloženu udaljenost Word Mover-a, dok se fiksnodimenzionalna projekcija postigne koristeći mjerljiv i učinkovit metod prilagodbe korijenjen u analizi topoloških podataka. Testiramo naš pristup, koji nazivamo EMAP-om ili uključivanjem različitih veličina i kompleksnosti na šest javno dostupnih podataka o klasifikaciji teksta. Empirički rezultati pokazuju da naš metod stalno izvodi sličan ili bolji od nekoliko alternativnih pristupa umjetnosti.', 'id': 'Konsep pengkode kalimat universal yang tidak diawasi telah mendapatkan traksi baru-baru ini, dimana model prapelatih menghasilkan representation tugas-agnostik dimensi-tetap efektif untuk frasa, kalimat dan paragraf. Metode seperti ini adalah kompleksitas yang berbeda, dari rata-rata-berat sederhana vektor kata ke model bahasa kompleks berdasarkan transformator bidireksi. Dalam pekerjaan ini kami mengusulkan teknik baru untuk menghasilkan kalimat-embedding dengan cara yang tidak diawasi dengan memproyeksikan kalimat ke dalam manifold dimensi-tetap dengan tujuan untuk mempertahankan lingkungan lokal di ruang asli. Untuk membatasi lingkungan-lingkungan seperti ini kami eksperimen dengan beberapa set-distance metrik, termasuk jarak Word Mover yang baru-baru ini diusulkan, sementara proyeksi fiks-dimensi dicapai dengan menggunakan metode pendekatan berkembang skala dan efisien berdasarkan analisis data topologi. Kami menguji pendekatan kami, yang kami sebut EMAP atau Embeddings oleh Pendekatan dan Projeksi Multipli, pada enam dataset klasifikasi teks yang tersedia publik dari ukuran dan kompleksitas yang berbeda. Empirical results show that our method consistently performs similar to or better than several alternative state-of-the-art approaches.', 'ko': '무감독 통용 문장 인코더의 개념이 최근 널리 주목받고 있다. 그 중에서 미리 훈련된 모델은 단어, 문장과 단락이 효과적인 임무를 생성하는 것과 무관한 고정적인 차원 표시이다.이런 방법의 복잡도는 각각 다르다. 간단한 어향량 가중권에서 양방향 변환을 바탕으로 하는 복잡한 언어 모델까지.이 작업에서 우리는 문장을 고정된 유류형에 투영하여 감독이 없는 방식으로 문장을 삽입하는 새로운 기술을 제시했다. 목적은 원시 공간에서 국부적인 이웃을 보존하는 것이다.이러한 이웃을 묘사하기 위해 우리는 최근에 제기된 단어 이동기 거리를 포함한 몇 가지 집합 거리 도량을 시도했다. 고정 차원 투영은 토폴로지 데이터 분석을 바탕으로 확장 가능하고 효율적인 유형 근사 방법을 사용하여 실현되었다.우리는 여섯 개의 크기와 복잡도가 다른 공개 텍스트 분류 데이터 집합에서 유형 근사와 투영을 통해 이를 EMAP 또는 삽입이라고 부르는 방법을 테스트했다.실증 결과에 의하면 우리의 방법은 시종 몇 가지 가장 선진적인 대체 방법보다 유사하거나 우수한 것으로 나타났다.', 'sw': 'Kadiri ya kupunguza hukumu za dunia zisizo sahihi imepata ufuatiliaji hivi karibuni, ambapo mitindo ya awali yaliyojifunza yanasababisha uwakilishaji wenye ufanisi wa kazi-agnostic kwa mujibu wa maneno, sentensi na vipengele. Njia hizi ni za tofauti tofauti, kutoka kwa wastani rahisi wa vectors wa maneno hadi mifano ya lugha inayotokana na mabadiliko ya bidii. Katika kazi hii tunapendekeza teknolojia ya riwaya ya kutengeneza kifungo cha hukumu kwa njia isiyohifadhiwa kwa kutayarisha hukumu hizo kwenye a in a mbalimbali yenye lengo la kulinda jirani za ndani katika anga halisi. Ili kuelezea majirani kama hizi tunajaribu kwa mitindo kadhaa ya umbali, ikiwa ni pamoja na umbali wa hivi karibuni unapendekezwa kwa Word Movement, wakati mradi wa kudumu umefanikiwa kwa kutumia mbinu za upatikanaji wa takwimu zilizo na ufanisi zilizotengenezwa katika uchambuzi wa taarifa za topolojia. Tunajaribu mbinu yetu, ambazo tunaita maeneo ya EMAP au Mazingira na Mradi wa Manifold, kwa takwimu sita za usambazaji wa maandishi yanayopatikana hadharani zinazotofautiana na ukubwa na utata. Matokeo ya matumaini yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu kwa kawaida hufanya kama hizo au bora zaidi ya mbinu mbadala za hali ya sanaa.', 'tr': 'Uniwersal sözleşmeler üçin arkalanmaýan düşünjüm ýok bir şekilde çykyp geldi. Bu ýerde öňe-öňe öňe-bilinmiş modeller frazler, sözler we paragraflar üçin etkinlik täsirli täsirli zady-agnostik fikir-ölçülikli täsirler döredir. Böyle çözümler karmaşıklygyny üýtgetmekdir, bidireksiyonal üýtgetmenlere dayanan basit çözümlerden söz vektörleriniň ortalamasyndan karmaşık dil nusgalaryndan. Bu işde biz sözlerimizi özüniň ýerli etraplarda hasaplamak maksady bilen, sözlerimizi beýleki ölçekli bir şekilde döretmek üçin täze bir teknik tekniki teklip berýäris. Böyle etraplary çözmek üçin biz birnäçe düzümlenmiş metrikler bilen synanyşýarys, ýöne "Word Mover\'yň uzakyny" diýip teklip eden s özleri tapylýar we ýeterlik hereket edip topolojik maglumatlarda kökülenen yaklaşyrma yöntemi ullanýarys. Biz öz ýaryşymyzy barlaýarys, muny Manifold ýaryşylyk we Projeksiýa tarapyndan EMAP ýa-da Ululyklary diýip kabul edip otyrýarys, alty publika meýilleşdirýän metin klasifikasiýasynyň düzümleri we çözürlikleri barada. Impirik netijelerimiz biziň metodamyzyň birnäçe alternatiw ýagdaýynda meňzeş ýa-da gowydygyny görkezýär.', 'af': "Die konsepte van ononderwerpende universele setkoders het onlangs traction ontvang, waarin voor-onderwerpende modele effektief taak-agnostiese vaste-dimensiese voorstellings genereer vir frase, setnings en paragraaf. Soos metodes is van verskillende kompleksiteit, van eenvoudige gewigte gemiddelde van woord vektore tot kompleks taal-modelles gebaseer op bidireksjonale transformeerders. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n nuwe teknik om sentence-embeddings in 'n onverondersteunde modus te genereer deur die setinge te projeseer op 'n vaste-dimensjonale manifolde met die doel van die bewaar van plaaslike nabygede in die oorspronklike spasie. Om sodanige naboorte te delinieer, eksperimenteer ons met verskeie stel-afstand metrike, insluitend die onlangs voorgestelde Woordskuiwer se afstand, terwyl die vaste-dimensjonale projeksie word bereik deur 'n skaalbaar en effektief manifolde aansondering metode gebruik wat in topologiese data analisie gewortel is. Ons probeer ons toegang, wat ons terme EMAP of Inbêding deur Manifold Aanvoudiging en Verwerking, op ses openlik beskikbaar teks-klasifikasie datastelle van verskillende grootte en kompleksiteit. Empiriese resultate wys dat ons metode konsistentlik uitvoer soos of beter as verskeie alternatiewe staat van die kuns toegang.", 'fa': 'مفهوم رمزگذاران جمله\u200cهای جهانی غیرقابل تعریف اخیراً ردیابی به دست آورده است، در حالی که مدل\u200cهای پیش آموزش شده\u200cاند، نمایش\u200cهای ثابت و اندازه\u200cای عملی برای جمله\u200cها، جمله\u200cها و پاراگراف\u200cها موجود می\u200cشوند. این روش\u200cها از تغییر پیچیدگی است، از میانگین وزن ساده\u200cهای ویکتورهای کلمه به مدل\u200cهای زبان پیچیده بر اساس تغییر\u200cدهندگان دوره\u200cای. در این کار ما یک تکنیک نوی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که در یک حالت غیرقابل تحریک جمله\u200cها را تولید کند با تولید کردن جمله\u200cها به یک چند مرتبه ثابت با هدف حفاظت محله\u200cهای محلی در فضا اصلی. برای تعیین کردن چنین محله\u200cها ما با چند متریک\u200cهای فاصله\u200cای متفاوت آزمایش می\u200cکنیم، شامل فاصله\u200cی حرکت\u200cکننده\u200cی Word Mover اخیرا، در حالی که پروژه\u200cهای ثابت بعدی با استفاده از روش تقریبا قابل مقیاس و موثرت\u200cپذیر و موثرت در تحلیل داده\u200cهای توپولو ما روش خود را آزمایش می کنیم، که به عنوان EMAP یا انجمن\u200cسازی توسط تقریبا و پروژه\u200cسازی متفاوت و اندازه\u200cهای متفاوت و پیچیدگی می\u200cگوییم. نتایج امپراطوری نشان می دهد که روش ما همیشه شبیه یا بهتر از چندین نزدیک موقعیت هنر انجام می دهد.', 'sq': 'Koncepti i koduesve të fjalëve universale të pazgjidhur ka fituar tërheqje kohët e fundit, ku modelet e parastërvitura gjenerojnë përfaqësime të efektshme tashmë-agnostike dimensionale fikse për frazat, fjalët dhe paragrafet. Metodat e tilla janë të kompleksitetit të ndryshëm, nga mesatarët e thjeshta të peshuara të vektorëve të fjalëve deri në modelet komplekse të gjuhës bazuar në transformuesit dy drejtues. Në këtë punë ne propozojmë një teknikë të re për të gjeneruar përfshirje fjalësh në një mënyrë të pazgjidhur duke projektuar fjalët në një shumicë dimensionale fikse me qëllim ruajtjen e lagjeve lokale në hapësirën origjinale. Për të përcaktuar lagje të tilla ne eksperimentojmë me disa metrika të distancës s ë caktuar, duke përfshirë distancën e Word Mover të propozuar kohët e fundit, ndërsa projeksioni fiks-dimensional arrihet duke përdorur një metodë të shkallëzueshme dhe efektive të përafërsisë së shumëfishtë të rrënjësuar në analizën topologjike të të dhënave. We test our approach, which we term EMAP or Embeddings by Manifold Approximation and Projection, on six publicly available text-classification datasets of varying size and complexity.  Rezultatet imperiale tregojnë se metoda jonë funksionon vazhdimisht në mënyrë të ngjashme apo më të mirë se disa metoda alternative më të larta.', 'am': 'የቀድሞው ተማሪዎቹ ሞዴላዎች ለሥርዓት፣ ቃላት እና ጽሑፎች በሥርዓት እና ጽሑፎች የሚያሳፍር የአካባቢ የፊደል ቃላት አካባቢ ክፍል አግኝቷል፡፡ እንደነዚህ ዓይነቶች በተለየ አካላቢነት፣ ከቀላል ሚዛን የቃላት vector ወደምትደነግፍ ቋንቋ-model በተመሳሳይ ለውጦች ለመደረጃ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ ውስጥ የቁጥጥር ግንኙነቶችን በመጀመሪያው ቦታዎች ውስጥ ለመጠበቅ በተደረገው አካባቢ ክፍል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ እንደነዚህ ያሉ ጎረቤቶችን ለማስተካከል፣ በቅርብ ጊዜ የተዘጋጀውን የቃላት ንቀሳቅስ እና የአካባቢ መልዕክት፣ በተለየ ጥያቄ እና በጥያቄ አካባቢ ድርጅት በመጠቀም አግኝቷል፡፡ የፕሮጀክት ፕሮጀክት እና ፕሮጀክት የተባለውን የኤምፕ ወይም የኢሜይል አካባቢዎች በተለየ መጠን እና በተለየ ስድስት የጽሑፍ-መግለጫ ዳታዎችን በተለየ መጠን እና በተጨማሪነት ላይ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የውጤት ውጤቶች ምናልባት ልማችን በተለየ የዐርድ ግንኙነት የሚበልጥ ወይም የሚሻል እንዲሆን ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Վերջերս անվերահսկված համընդհանուր նախադասությունների կոդերների գաղափարը գրավել է, որտեղ նախապատրաստված մոդելները ստեղծում են արդյունավետ խնդիր-ագնոստիկ ֆիքսային-չափսեր արտահայտություններ արտահայտությունների, նախադասությունների և պարագաների համար Այսպիսի մեթոդները տարբեր բարդություններ են, բառերի վեկտորների պարզ կենտրոնացված միջիներից մինչև բարդ լեզվի մոդելներ, որոնք հիմնված են երկու ուղղությամբ վերափոխողների վրա: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր տեխնիկան նախադասությունների ներգրավման առանց վերահսկման ձևի ստեղծելու, նախադասությունները պրոյեկտելով հաստատուն չափերի բազմաթիվ, որի նպատակն է պահպանել տեղական հարևանքները սկզբնական տարածքում: Այսպիսի շրջաններ սահմանելու համար մենք փորձում ենք բազմաթիվ սահմանափակ հեռավորության մետրիկներով, ներառյալ վերջերս առաջարկված բառերի շարժիչի հեռավորությունը, մինչդեռ ֆիքսավոր չափերի պրոեկցիան հասնում է օգտագործելով գոյաբանական տվյալների վերլուծության արմատակարգվող և արդ Մենք ստուգում ենք մեր մոտեցումը, որը մենք անվանում ենք "ԷՄԱՊ" կամ "Մոլորտում" բազմաթիվ մոտեցումների և պրոեկցիաների միջոցով, տարբեր չափերի և բարդությունների վեց հանրային հասանելի տեքստի դասակարգումների տվյալների վրա: Իմպրիկական արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը մշտապես նման է կամ ավելի լավ է, քան տարբեր նորագույն մոտեցումները:', 'az': "Əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş üniversal cümlələr kodlayıcıların düşüncəsi yaxın zamanda trafik alındı, orada əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş modellər fərz, cümlələr və paragraflar üçün effektiv task-agnostik fikirli ölçülü təhsil göstəricisi yaratdı. Bütün bu metodlar müxtəlif bir kompleksitədir, sadəcə ağırlıq vektorların ortasından, ikidiktiv transformatörlərə dayanan kompleks dil modellerinə. Bu işdə, sözləri tədriclə tədriclə tədricləmək üçün yeni bir tekniki təklif edirik ki, tədriclə tədriclə yerli məmləkətlərin məqsədilə yerli məmləkətlərini tərzdə qorumaq istəyirik. Bütün məmləkətləri ayırmaq üçün çox uzaq metrikləri ilə təcrübə edirik, son zamanlarda təcrübə edilmiş Word Mover'in uzaqlaşığını da dahil edərik. Bu təcrübə ölçülü projeksiyon topolojik verilər analizi ilə çəkilmiş çəkilmə və müvəffəqiyyətli çox yaxınlıq metodu istifadə edərək başarılır. Biz öz tərəfimizi imtahana çəkirik ki, EMAP və ya Yaxınlıq və Proqramlar vasitəsilə, altı halda müxtəlif ölçü və kompleksitə olan metin klasifikasyonu veri qurmaqları ilə imtahana çəkirik. İmparikalı sonuçlar göstərir ki, metodumuzun bir neçə alternatif şəkildə müəyyən ediləndən və ya daha yaxşı işlər edir.", 'bs': 'Koncept neodređenog univerzalnog kodera rečenice nedavno je dobio traku, u kojem su predobučeni modeli generirali učinkovite funkcionalne agnostičke fiksnodimenzionalne predstave fraze, rečenica i paragrafa. Takve metode su različite kompleksnosti, od jednostavnih težinskih srednjih vektora riječi do kompleksnih jezičkih modela na temelju bidirektivnih transformatora. U ovom poslu predlažemo novu tehniku za stvaranje rečenica na neodređenom načinu projekcijom rečenica na fiksno dimenzionalno mnogobrojno sa ciljem čuvanja lokalnih susjedstva u originalnom prostoru. Da bismo delinirali takve komšiluke, eksperimentirali smo s nekoliko metrika za određenu udaljenost, uključujući nedavno predloženu udaljenost Word Mover-a, dok se fiksnodimenzionalna projekcija postigne koristeći skalabilnu i efikasnu metodu prilagodbe korijenjenu u analizi topoloških podataka. Testiramo naš pristup, koji izrazimo EMAP ili uključenje mnogim približavanjem i projekcijama, na šest javno dostupnih podataka o klasifikaciji teksta s različitim veličinom i kompleksnošću. Empirički rezultati pokazuju da naša metoda stalno izvodi sličnu ili bolju od nekoliko alternativnih pristupa stanju umjetnosti.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক সম্প্রতি অরক্ষিত বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের এনকোডারের ধারণা ট্র্যাক্সেশন পেয়েছে, যেখানে পূর্ববর্তী প্রশিক্ষিত মডেল কার্যকর কাজ, অ্যাঙ্নোস এই ধরনের পদ্ধতি বিভিন্ন জটিলতার বিভিন্ন ধরনের, সাধারণ ভেক্টরের ভেক্টর থেকে বাইডিয়েন্টিকেল পরিবর্তনের ভিত্তিতে কমপ্লি এই কাজে আমরা একটি নভেল প্রযুক্তির প্রস্তাব করছি যাতে শাস্তি সংরক্ষিত করা হয়েছে বিভিন্ন ধরনের মাধ্যমে স্থানীয় প্রতিবেশীদের সংরক্ষণের উদ্দেশ্যে স্থানীয় প্রতি সাম্প্রতিক প্রস্তাবিত শব্দ মোভারের দূরত্বের মধ্যে আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি সেট দূরত্বের পরীক্ষায় পরীক্ষা করছি, যেখানে স্থায়ী মাত্রার প্রকল্পের মাধ্যমে প্রস্তাবিত বিভিন্ন প্রকল্প আমরা আমাদের পদক্ষেপ পরীক্ষা করি, যেখানে আমরা ম্যানিফোল্ড অ্যাপ্রোক্সিমেশন এবং প্রজেক্টের মাধ্যমে ইমেপি অথবা এমেবেডিং এর মানে বিভিন্ন আকার সম্মানিত ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি সাধারণত বেশ কিছু বিকল্প রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের চেয়ে ভালো কিংবা ভাল কাজ করে।', 'ca': "El concepte de codificadors universals de frases no supervisades ha guanyat tractió fa poc, en què models pré-entrenats generen representacions efectives de tasca-agnòstica a dimensions fixes per frases, frases i paràgrafs. Aquests mètodes són de complexitat diferent, des de les mitjanes ponderades senzilles de vectors de paraules fins a models complexes de llenguatge basats en transformadors bidireccionals. En aquest treball proposem una nova tècnica per generar incorporacions de frases de manera no supervisada projectant les frases en un multiplicat de dimensions fixes amb l'objectiu de preservar barris locals a l'espai original. Per definir aquests barris experimentem amb diverses mètriques de distància fixa, incloent la distància de Word Mover proposada recentment, mentre la projecció de dimensions fixes es aconsegui utilitzant un mètode d'aproximació multipla escalable i eficient enraixat en l'anàlisi topològic de dades. Testem el nostre enfocament, que anomenem EMAP o Embeddings by Manifold Approximation and Projection, en sis conjunts de dades de classificació de textos disponibles públicament de mida i complexitat diferents. Els resultats empírics mostren que el nostre mètode funciona de manera constant semblant o millor que diversos enfocaments alternativs d'última generació.", 'cs': 'Koncept univerzálních snímačů vět bez dohledu získal v poslední době na tréninku, kdy předškolené modely generují efektivní pevně-rozměrné reprezentace pro fráze, věty a odstavce. Tyto metody jsou různě složité, od jednoduchých vážených průměrů slovních vektorů až po komplexní jazykové modely založené na obousměrných transformátorech. V této práci navrhujeme novou techniku generování větových vložení bez dozoru projekcí vět do pevně rozměrného množství s cílem zachovat místní čtvrti v původním prostoru. Pro vymezení těchto čtvrtí experimentujeme s několika metrikami nastavené vzdálenosti, včetně nedávno navržené vzdálenosti Word Mover, zatímco pevně dimenzionální projekce je dosaženo pomocí škálovatelné a efektivní metody rozmanité aproximace zakořeněné v topologické analýze dat. Náš přístup, který nazýváme EMAP nebo Embeddings by Manifold Approximation and Projection, testujeme na šesti veřejně dostupných datových sadách klasifikace textů různé velikosti a složitosti. Empirické výsledky ukazují, že naše metoda konzistentně funguje podobně nebo lepší než několik alternativních nejmodernějších přístupů.', 'et': 'Järelevalveta universaalsete lausekodeerijate kontseptsioon on hiljuti omandanud tõuke, kus eelõpetatud mudelid loovad efektiivseid ülesannetega agnostilisi fikseeritud mõõtmetega esitlusi fraasidele, lausetele ja lõigetele. Sellised meetodid on erineva keerukusega, alates sõnavaktorite lihtsatest kaalutud keskmistest kuni kahesuunalistel transformaatoritel põhinevate keelemudeliteni. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uudse tehnika, mille abil tekitada järelevalveta lauseid, projiseerides laused fikseeritud mõõtmetega kollektorile eesmärgiga säilitada kohalikud naabruskonnad algses ruumis. Selliste piirkondade piiritlemiseks eksperimenteerime mitmeid seadistatud distantsi mõõdikuid, sealhulgas hiljuti kavandatud Word Moveri kaugust, samas kui fikseeritud mõõtmetega projektsioon saavutatakse kasutades skaleeritavat ja tõhusat mitmekülgset lähenemismeetodit, mille juures on topoloogiline andmeanalüüs. Testime oma lähenemisviisi, mida nimetame EMAP-ks või mitmekülgse lähenemise ja prognoosimise põhjal, kuuel avalikult kättesaadaval erineva suuruse ja keerukusega tekstiklassifikatsiooni andmekogumil. Empiirilised tulemused näitavad, et meie meetod toimib pidevalt sarnaselt või paremini kui mitmed alternatiivsed kaasaegsed lähenemisviisid.', 'fi': 'Valvontattomien universaalien lauseenkooderien käsite on saanut viime aikoina jalansijaa, jossa esikoulutetut mallit tuottavat tehokkaita tehtäväagnostisia kiinteäulotteisia esityksiä lauseille, lauseille ja kappaleille. Tällaiset menetelmät ovat monimutkaisia, yksinkertaisista sanavektorien painotetuista keskiarvoista monimutkaisiin kielimalleihin, jotka perustuvat kaksisuuntaisiin muuntajiin. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta tekniikkaa lauseiden upottamiseksi valvomattomasti projisoimalla lauseet kiinteäulotteiseen sarjaan tavoitteena säilyttää paikalliset naapurustot alkuperäisessä tilassa. Tällaisten kaupunginosien rajaamiseksi kokeilemme useita joukko-etäisyysmittareita, kuten äskettäin ehdotettua Word Moverin etäisyyttä, kun taas kiinteä-ulotteinen projektio saavutetaan käyttämällä skaalautuvaa ja tehokasta moniulotteista approkaatiomenetelmää, joka perustuu topologiseen dataanalyysiin. Testaamme lähestymistapaamme, jota kutsumme EMAP:ksi tai Embeddings by Manifold Approximation and Projection -upotuksiksi, kuudella julkisesti saatavilla olevalla, erikokoisella ja monimutkaisella tekstiluokituksen aineistolla. Empiiriset tulokset osoittavat, että menetelmämme on johdonmukaisesti samanlainen tai parempi kuin useat vaihtoehtoiset uusimmat lähestymistavat.', 'jv': 'General Laptop" and "Desktop Nang barêng-barêng iki kita gênggunaké tékno sing nêmên penting nggawe barang-tékno kanggo ngilangno kuwi mau sing nêmên kuwi mau, dadi jenis-jenis kanggo ngerawak dhéwé kuwi aturan tambah kuwi nggawe nguasai perusahaan anyar mên. Ngawe nambah karo hal-hal nganggo hukum gawe nguasai karo sekang-dur Metika, dadi sing nyimpen nggawe Word Move\'s Distance, terus aksi iki bakal terus aksi iki bakal terus lanjut sampeyan iki bakal terus ono akeh lanjut sampeyan sistem tau dadi nyong alamat sak batasan dadi nyong. We test the method we use, that we use the terms EMHP or embedding by Manifolder Apjection and Projection, on 6 Rejuwisan empires menehi wong-ngomong nik akeh sistem sing bisa gerarané karo ngono sing luwih apik sing bisa dianteksi state-of-the-arts', 'ha': "Kazon kodi na ɗabi'a da ba'a tsare shi ba na ƙari ya sãmi trace a yanzu, a lokacin da motel masu yin amfani da shiryarwa masu amfani da aikin-agnostic mai daidaita aiki na rubutu, takardar da kuma fassaran. Haƙĩƙa, waɗannan hanyõyin su ne daga masu sãɓãwa, daga tsakanin sauri masu nau'i da sauri zuwa misãlai-harshe masu husu'a kan shige masu sakan. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗa wani takwici na nowaya da za'a ƙiƙiro sauran da aka tsare shi a cikin wani tsari ba da tsare shi, ko kuma za mu yi musamman maganar a kan duffai mai tsari da matabbata cikin fili na farko. To delicate such neighbourhood, za'a jarraba shi da wasu metrics mai nĩsa, kamar da aka ƙayyade na farkon da aka faɗi maganar Mover, a lokacin da za'a samar da kimar-dimensiona da kuma za'a sami wani metode mai lissafa da kuma mai Effekt zafi wanda aka ƙara cikin Analyza data na topogical. We test our approach, which we term EMAP or Embeddings by Manifold Approximation and Projection, on six publicly available text-classification datasets of varying size and complexity.  Mataimakin Empirical na nuna cewa metodenmu yana da daidai ko kuma mafi alhẽri daga wasu masu shida-halin-sanar.", 'sk': 'Koncept neobzorovanih univerzalnih kodirnikov stavkov se je v zadnjem času začel uporabljati, pri čemer vnaprej usposobljeni modeli ustvarjajo učinkovite naloge agnostične fiksne dimenzionalne predstavitve stavkov, stavkov in odstavkov. Takšne metode so različne kompleksnosti, od preprostih tehtanih povprečij besednih vektorjev do kompleksnih jezikovnih modelov, ki temeljijo na dvosmernih transformatorjih. V tem delu predlagamo novo tehniko za ustvarjanje stavkov na nenadzorovan način s projiciranjem stavkov na fiksno dimenzionalno množico s ciljem ohranjanja lokalnih sosesk v prvotnem prostoru. Za določitev takšnih sosesk eksperimentiramo z več metričnimi razdaljami, vključno z nedavno predlaganim Word Moverjem, fiksno dimenzijsko projekcijo pa dosežemo z uporabo razširljive in učinkovite metode približevanja množic, ki temelji na topološki analizi podatkov. Naš pristop, ki ga imenujemo EMAP ali vdelave z množično približevanje in projekcijo, preizkušamo na šestih javno dostopnih zbirkah podatkov o klasifikaciji besedila različnih velikosti in kompleksnosti. Empirični rezultati kažejo, da je naša metoda dosledno podobna ali boljša od več alternativnih najsodobnejših pristopov.', 'he': 'המושג של קודפי משפטים אוניברסליים ללא השגחה קיבל משיכה לאחרונה, שבה דוגמנים מאומנים מראש יוצרים מייצגים משימה-אגנוסטיים מימדים קבועים יעילים למילים, משפטים ופרטים. שיטות כאלה הן של מורכבות שונות, ממוצעי משקל פשוטים של ווקטורים מילים למודלים שפות מורכבים מבוססים על משתנים שתיים כיוונים. בעבודה הזו אנו מציעים טכניקה חדשה לייצר תוספות משפטים באופן בלתי משגיח על ידי פרוייקציה של המשפטים למספר מימדי קבוע עם המטרה לשמור על שכונות מקומיות בחלל המקורי. כדי להגדיר שכונות כאלה אנו מנסים עם מספר מטריות מרחק קבוע, כולל מרחק המעבר המילים המוצע לאחרונה, בזמן שהפרוייקציה המימדית קבועה מושגת על ידי שיטת התקרבות מיוחדת אפקטיבית ומעובדת ששורשת בניתוח נתונים טופולוגיים. אנחנו בודקים את הגישה שלנו, שאנחנו מכנים EMAP או Embeddings על ידי התקרבות ומפריקציה רבה, על שש קבוצות מידע מסווג טקסט זמינות לציבור של גודל ומורכב שונה. התוצאות האימפריות מראות שהשיטה שלנו מבצעת באופן קבוע דומה או טובה יותר ממספר גישות חדשות.', 'bo': "སྤྱིར་བཏང་མེད་པའི་ཡོངས་ཁྱད་པར འདི་དག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་འདྲ་ཞིག་མི་འདྲ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས། རྩ་བའི་འགྱུར་ཅན་ཅིག་ལས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་གཞན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག འོག་གི་ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཚིག་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་བཟོ་རྩོམ་ཅིག་སྤྲོད་དགོས་མིན་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གསར་གཏོང་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གིས་ཚོར་མེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ཡོད་པ To delineate such neighbourhoods we experiment with several set-distance metrics, including the recently proposed Word Mover's distance, while the fixed-dimensional projection is achieved by employing a scalable and efficient manifold approximation method rooted in topological data analysis. ང་ཚོ གཟུགས་རིས་གྱི་འབྲུག"}
{'en': 'Disambiguatory Signals are Stronger in Word-initial Positions', 'ar': 'الإشارات المبهمة أقوى في المواقف الأولية للكلمة', 'es': 'Las señales desambiguadoras son más fuertes en las posiciones iniciales de palabras', 'pt': 'Sinais desambiguatórios são mais fortes em posições iniciais de palavras', 'fr': 'Les signaux désambiguatoires sont plus forts dans les positions initiales des mots', 'ja': '曖昧なシグナルは、単語の初期位置でより強くなります', 'zh': '消歧义信号在单词首字母位益强', 'hi': 'Disambiguatory सिग्नल Word-initial Positions में मजबूत होते हैं', 'ru': 'Несогласованные сигналы сильнее в словах - начальных позициях', 'ga': 'Tá Comharthaí Dé-athbhrí níos Láidre i Staideanna Tosaigh Focal', 'ka': 'სიტყვების დასაწყისში სიგნალეები ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან', 'it': 'I segnali non ambigui sono più forti nelle posizioni iniziali della parola', 'el': 'Τα διακριτικά σήματα είναι ισχυρότερα στις αρχικές θέσεις λέξεων', 'lt': 'Disambiguatory Signals are Stronger in Word-initial Positions', 'hu': 'Az egyértelmű jelek erősebbek a Word-kezdeti pozíciókban', 'ml': 'വാക്ക്- ആദ്യമായ സ്ഥിതികളില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ശക്തിയുള്ളവ', 'kk': 'Бұғаттау сигналары сөздің бастапқы орындарында күшті', 'mk': 'Дизамбигуативните сигнали се посилни во почетните позиции на зборови', 'no': 'Slått av signalar er større i ordoppstartplasseringar', 'ms': 'isyarat tidak ambiguasi lebih kuat dalam kedudukan awal-perkataan', 'pl': 'Sygnały jednoznaczne są silniejsze w pozycjach początkowych słowa', 'ro': 'Semnalele dezambiguizatoare sunt mai puternice în pozițiile inițiale Word', 'sr': 'Disambiguatorni signali su jači u početnoj poziciji reči', 'mn': 'Сүйтгэл хөдлөлийн сигналууд үгнээс эхлэх нөхцөлд илүү хүчтэй.', 'si': 'අක්\u200dරීය සංඥාවක් වචන- පටන් ස්ථානයට වඩා ශක්තිමත් වෙනවා', 'mt': 'Disambiguatory Signals are Stronger in Word-initial Positions', 'so': 'Signaadaha qalloocan waa ka xoog badan yihiin xaaladaha hore ee hadalka', 'sv': 'Tydliga signaler är starkare i ordinitiala positioner', 'ta': 'வார்த்தை- ஆரம்ப நிலையில் மிக வலிமையான குறிகள்', 'ur': 'آغاز مضبوط سیگنالیں کلمات-آغاز مضبوط موقعیت میں زیادہ طاقتور ہیں', 'vi': 'Những dấu hiệu bị biến đổi mạnh hơn', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Диамбигиращите сигнали са по-силни в началните позиции на думи', 'de': 'Unzweideutige Signale sind stärker in Wort-Anfangspositionen', 'nl': 'Disambiguatory Signals zijn sterker in woord-initiële posities', 'da': 'Disambiguative signaler er stærkere i Word-startpositioner', 'hr': 'Disambiguatorni signali su jači u početnim položajima riječi', 'id': 'Sinyal tidak ambiguasi lebih kuat dalam posisi awal-kata', 'fa': 'سیگنال\u200cهای ناپذیری در موقعیت\u200cهای اولیه\u200cی کلمه قوی\u200cتر است', 'ko': '변조 신호는 단어의 초기 위치에서 더욱 강하다', 'tr': 'Sinyallar sözbaşy Boýunça Kiçi', 'sw': 'Signali za ubaguzi ni wenye nguvu katika maeneo ya awali ya neno', 'sq': 'Sinjalet e jashtëzakonshme janë më të forta në pozicionet fillestare të fjalës', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'af': 'Ontbrekende Signale is sterker in Woord- aanvanklike Posisies', 'bn': 'শব্দ- প্রাথমিক অবস্থানে বিভ্রান্ত স্বাক্ষর', 'hy': 'Բառերի սկզբնական դիրքերում բառերի ազդանշանները ավելի ուժեղ են,', 'cs': 'Jednotlivé signály jsou silnější ve slovních pozicích', 'ca': 'Disambiguatory Signals are Stronger in Word-initial Positions', 'et': 'Disambigeerivad signaalid on tugevamad sõna esialgsetes asendites', 'fi': 'Erottavat signaalit ovat vahvempia Word-alkuasennoissa', 'bs': 'Disambiguatorni signali su jači u početnim položajima riječi', 'az': 'Sözlərin başlanğıç məqamlarında daha qüvvətlidir', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'סימנים מבטלים הם חזקים יותר בעמדות קודמות מילים', 'sk': 'Razločljivi signali so močnejši v začetnih položajih besedila', 'jv': 'Signal strength', 'bo': 'འགོ་སློང་མྱོང་པའི་མིང་རྟགས་ཚོས་ཐོག་འགོ་འཛུགས་གནས་ཡུལ་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་ནུས་པ'}
{'en': 'Psycholinguistic studies of human word processing and lexical access provide ample evidence of the preferred nature of word-initial versus word-final segments, e.g., in terms of attention paid by listeners (greater) or the likelihood of reduction by speakers (lower). This has led to the conjectureas in Wedel et al. (2019b), but common elsewherethat languages have evolved to provide more information earlier in words than later. Information-theoretic methods to establish such tendencies in lexicons have suffered from several methodological shortcomings that leave open the question of whether this high word-initial informativeness is actually a property of the lexicon or simply an artefact of the incremental nature of recognition. In this paper, we point out the confounds in existing methods for comparing the informativeness of segments early in the word versus later in the word, and present several new measures that avoid these confounds. When controlling for these confounds, we still find evidence across hundreds of languages that indeed there is a cross-linguistic tendency to front-load information in words.', 'ar': 'توفر الدراسات اللغوية النفسية لمعالجة الكلمات البشرية والوصول المعجمي دليلًا وافرًا على الطبيعة المفضلة للمقاطع الأولية للكلمة مقابل مقاطع الكلمة النهائية ، على سبيل المثال ، من حيث الاهتمام الذي يوليه المستمعون (أكبر) أو احتمال تقليل المتحدثين (أقل). وقد أدى هذا إلى التخمين - كما في فيديل وآخرون. (2019b) ، ولكنه شائع في أماكن أخرى - لقد تطورت هذه اللغات لتقديم المزيد من المعلومات في وقت مبكر بالكلمات وليس في وقت لاحق. لقد عانت الأساليب المعلوماتية النظرية لتأسيس مثل هذه الميول في المعاجم من العديد من أوجه القصور المنهجية التي تترك المجال مفتوحًا لمسألة ما إذا كانت هذه المعلوماتية الأولية للكلمة هي في الواقع خاصية للمعجم أو مجرد نتاج للطبيعة المتزايدة للاعتراف. في هذه الورقة ، نشير إلى الالتباس في الطرق الحالية لمقارنة المعلوماتية للقطاعات في وقت مبكر من الكلمة مقابل لاحقًا في الكلمة ، ونقدم عدة مقاييس جديدة تتجنب هذه الالتباسات. عند التحكم في هذه الالتباسات ، ما زلنا نجد دليلًا عبر مئات اللغات على أن هناك بالفعل ميلًا لغويًا مشتركًا لتحميل المعلومات مسبقًا بالكلمات.', 'pt': 'Estudos psicolinguísticos de processamento de palavras humano e acesso lexical fornecem ampla evidência da natureza preferencial dos segmentos iniciais da palavra versus final da palavra, por exemplo, em termos de atenção prestada pelos ouvintes (maior) ou a probabilidade de redução pelos falantes (menor). Isso levou à conjectura – como em Wedel et al. (2019b), mas comum em outros lugares – que os idiomas evoluíram para fornecer mais informações mais cedo em palavras do que depois. Os métodos da teoria da informação para estabelecer tais tendências nos léxicos sofreram com várias deficiências metodológicas que deixam em aberto a questão se essa alta informatividade inicial da palavra é realmente uma propriedade do léxico ou simplesmente um artefato da natureza incremental do reconhecimento. Neste artigo, apontamos os confundimentos nos métodos existentes para comparar a informatividade de segmentos no início da palavra versus mais tarde na palavra e apresentamos várias novas medidas que evitam esses confundimentos. Ao controlar esses confundimentos, ainda encontramos evidências em centenas de idiomas de que, de fato, há uma tendência linguística cruzada de antecipar informações em palavras.', 'fr': "Les études psycholinguistiques du traitement de texte humain et de l'accès lexical fournissent de nombreuses preuves de la nature préférée des segments initiaux par rapport aux segments finaux, par exemple en termes d'attention accordée par les auditeurs (plus grande) ou de probabilité de réduction par les locuteurs (plus faible). Cela a conduit à l'hypothèse — comme dans Wedel et al. (2019b), mais courante ailleurs — selon laquelle les langues ont évolué pour fournir plus d'informations plus tôt dans les mots que plus tard. Les méthodes de théorie de l'information pour établir de telles tendances dans les lexiques ont souffert de plusieurs lacunes méthodologiques qui laissent ouverte la question de savoir si cette haute informativité initiale des mots est en fait une propriété du lexique ou simplement un artefact de la nature incrémentielle de la reconnaissance. Dans cet article, nous soulignons les facteurs de confusion dans les méthodes existantes pour comparer le caractère informatif des segments au début du mot par rapport à ceux qui se trouvent plus tard dans le mot, et nous présentons plusieurs nouvelles mesures qui évitent ces confusions. En tenant compte de ces facteurs de confusion, nous trouvons toujours des preuves, dans des centaines de langues, qu'il existe effectivement une tendance interlinguistique à charger l'information en premier lieu sous forme de mots.", 'es': 'Los estudios psicolingüísticos del procesamiento de textos humanos y el acceso léxico proporcionan amplia evidencia de la naturaleza preferida de los segmentos iniciales de palabras frente a los finales de palabras, por ejemplo, en términos de atención prestada por los oyentes (mayor) o la probabilidad de reducción por parte de los hablantes (menor). Esto ha llevado a la conjetura —como en Wedel et al. (2019b), pero común en otras partes— de que los idiomas han evolucionado para proporcionar más información en palabras antes que después. Los métodos de la teoría de la información para establecer tales tendencias en los léxicos han sufrido varias deficiencias metodológicas que dejan abierta la pregunta de si esta alta capacidad de información inicial de palabra es realmente una propiedad del léxico o simplemente un artefacto de la naturaleza incremental del reconocimiento. En este artículo, señalamos las confusiones en los métodos existentes para comparar la capacidad de información de los segmentos al principio del mundo con los posteriores en el mundo, y presentamos varias medidas nuevas que evitan estos confusiones. Al controlar estas confundiciones, todavía encontramos evidencia en cientos de idiomas de que, de hecho, hay una tendencia interlingüística a anticipar la información en palabras.', 'ja': '人間の単語処理および語彙アクセスの心理言語学的研究は、例えば、リスナーによる注意（より大きい）または話者による削減の可能性（より低い）の観点から、単語の初期セグメントと単語の最終セグメントの好ましい性質の十分な証拠を提供する。 これは、Wedel et al. (2019 b)のように推測につながっているが、他の場所では一般的である。言語は、言葉でより早くより多くの情報を提供するように進化してきた。 辞書におけるそのような傾向を確立するための情報理論的方法論は、いくつかの方法論的欠点に苦しんでおり、この高い初期情報性が実際には辞書の特性なのか、それとも単に認識の増分的性質のアーティファクトなのかという問題を残している。 本稿では、単語の初期と単語の後期のセグメントの情報性を比較するための既存の方法の混乱を指摘し、これらの混乱を回避するいくつかの新しい尺度を提示する。 これらの混乱を制御する際、私たちはまだ何百もの言語にわたって、言葉で情報を前面に読み込むクロスリンガルな傾向があるという証拠を見つけます。', 'hi': 'मानव शब्द प्रसंस्करण और लेक्सिकल एक्सेस के मनोवैज्ञानिक अध्ययन शब्द-प्रारंभिक बनाम शब्द-अंतिम खंडों की पसंदीदा प्रकृति के पर्याप्त सबूत प्रदान करते हैं, उदाहरण के लिए, श्रोताओं द्वारा भुगतान किए गए ध्यान (अधिक से अधिक) या वक्ताओं द्वारा कमी की संभावना (कम) के संदर्भ में। इसने अनुमान लगाया है - जैसा कि वेडेल एट अल (201 9 बी) में है, लेकिन कहीं और आम है - कि भाषाओं ने बाद की तुलना में शब्दों में पहले अधिक जानकारी प्रदान करने के लिए विकसित किया है। शब्दकोशों में ऐसी प्रवृत्तियों को स्थापित करने के लिए सूचना-सैद्धांतिक तरीकों ने कई पद्धतिगत कमियों का सामना किया है जो इस सवाल को खुला छोड़ देते हैं कि क्या यह उच्च शब्द-प्रारंभिक सूचनात्मकता वास्तव में शब्दकोश की संपत्ति है या बस मान्यता की वृद्धिशील प्रकृति की एक कलाकृति है। इस पेपर में, हम शब्द में बाद में बनाम बाद में शब्द में शुरुआती खंडों की सूचनात्मकता की तुलना करने के लिए मौजूदा तरीकों में उलझनों को इंगित करते हैं, और कई नए उपाय प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो इन उलझनों से बचते हैं। इन confounds के लिए नियंत्रित करते समय, हम अभी भी सैकड़ों भाषाओं में सबूत पाते हैं कि वास्तव में शब्दों में जानकारी को सामने लोड करने के लिए एक क्रॉस-भाषाई प्रवृत्ति है।', 'zh': '人文字处理词汇之心语言学穷证据,证单词首字母与词尾片段之偏善,如听众之意(大)言者损者(下)。 此致一想——如Wedel et al. (2019b),而他处常见——语已进化于单词中较后更早供信息。 立词典之信,受方法学之阙,其病有一,即此高单词首字母之信息量,实词典之性,犹识增量之人工制品也。 凡本文,指今法混淆,所以较单词早期与单词后期片段信息性,并举避混淆之新。 制此混淆,犹见证明于数百种言,实有跨语之倾,预加载信息于单词中。', 'ru': 'Психолингвистические исследования обработки человеческих слов и лексического доступа предоставляют достаточные доказательства предпочтительной природы словесно-инициативных сегментов по сравнению со словесно-финальными сегментами, например, с точки зрения внимания, уделяемого слушателями (больше) или вероятности сокращения говорящими (меньше). Это привело к гипотезе - как в работе Wedel et al. (2019b), но распространено в других местах - что языки эволюционировали, чтобы предоставить больше информации раньше, чем позже. Информационно-теоретические методы установления таких тенденций в лексиконах страдают несколькими методологическими недостатками, которые оставляют открытым вопрос о том, является ли эта высокая словесно-инициативная информативность на самом деле свойством лексикона или просто артефактом инкрементного характера распознавания. В этой работе мы указываем на путаницы в существующих методах сравнения информативности сегментов в начале слова по сравнению с более поздним словом, и представляем несколько новых мер, которые избегают этих путаниц. Когда мы контролируем эти путаницы, мы все еще находим доказательства в сотнях языков, что действительно существует кросс-лингвистическая тенденция к фронтальной загрузке информации в слова.', 'ga': 'Soláthraíonn staidéir shíctheangeolaíocha ar phróiseáil focal daonna agus rochtain foclóireachta go leor fianaise ar an rogha nádúr na míre tosaigh focal i gcomparáid le míreanna deiridh focal, m.sh., i dtéarmaí aird a thugann éisteoirí (níos mó) nó an dóchúlacht go laghdóidh cainteoirí (níos ísle). Is é an toradh a bhí ar an tuairim ná—mar atá i Wedel et al. (2019b), ach coitianta in áiteanna eile—go bhfuil teangacha tagtha chun cinn chun tuilleadh faisnéise a sholáthar i bhfocail níos luaithe ná níos déanaí. D’fhulaing modhanna teoiriciúla faisnéise chun treochtaí den sórt sin i bhfoclóirí a shuíomh roinnt easnaimh mhodheolaíochta a fhágann go bhfuil an cheist i gceist cé acu an airí de chuid an fhoclóra i ndáiríre nó go díreach déantán de chineál incriminteach an aitheantais é an t-eolas tosaigh ard focal seo. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid in iúl na confounds atá sna modhanna atá ann cheana féin chun comparáid a dhéanamh idir faisnéiseach na míreanna go luath san fhocal agus níos déanaí san fhocal, agus cuirimid roinnt beart nua i láthair a sheachnaíonn na confounds seo. Agus muid ag déanamh smachta ar na coinbhinsiúin seo, feicimid fós fianaise ar fud na gcéadta teangacha go bhfuil claonadh tras-teangeolaíoch ann chun eolas a chur chun tosaigh i bhfocail.', 'el': 'Οι ψυχογλωσσικές μελέτες της ανθρώπινης επεξεργασίας κειμένου και της λεξικής πρόσβασης παρέχουν άφθονες αποδείξεις για την προτιμώμενη φύση των τμημάτων λέξης-αρχικής έναντι λέξης-τελικής, π.χ. όσον αφορά την προσοχή που δίνεται από τους ακροατές (μεγαλύτερη) ή την πιθανότητα μείωσης από τους ομιλητές (χαμηλότερη). Αυτό έχει οδηγήσει στην εικασία -όπως και στο Γουέντελ κ.λ. (2019β), αλλά κοινές αλλού- ότι οι γλώσσες έχουν εξελιχθεί για να παρέχουν περισσότερες πληροφορίες νωρίτερα σε λέξεις παρά αργότερα. Οι πληροφοριοθeoretische μέθοδοι για την καθιέρωση τέτοιων τάσεων στα λεξικά έχουν υποστεί αρκετές μεθοδολογικές ελλείψεις που αφήνουν ανοιχτό το ερώτημα αν αυτή η υψηλή λέξη-αρχική πληροφορικότητα είναι πράγματι ιδιότητα του λεξικού ή απλά ένα τεχνούργημα της αυξανόμενης φύσης της αναγνώρισης. Σε αυτή την εργασία, επισημαίνουμε τις διαταραχές στις υπάρχουσες μεθόδους για τη σύγκριση της πληροφορικότητας των τμημάτων νωρίς στη λέξη έναντι αργότερα στη λέξη, και παρουσιάζουμε διάφορα νέα μέτρα που αποφεύγουν αυτές τις διαταραχές. Όταν ελέγχουμε αυτές τις διαταραχές, εξακολουθούμε να βρίσκουμε στοιχεία σε εκατοντάδες γλώσσες ότι πράγματι υπάρχει μια γλωσσική τάση να φορτώνουμε πληροφορίες με λέξεις.', 'hu': 'Az emberi szövegfeldolgozás és a lexikális hozzáférés pszicholingvistikus tanulmányai bőséges bizonyítékot nyújtanak a szókezdeti és a szóvégső szegmensek preferált természetére, például a hallgatók figyelmét (nagyobb) vagy a beszélők csökkentésének valószínűségére (alacsonyabb). Ez vezetett arra a feltételezésre, mint Wedel et al. (2019b), de máshol gyakori, hogy a nyelvek fejlődtek, hogy több információt nyújtsanak szavakban, mint később. Az ilyen tendenciák lexikonokban történő megállapítására szolgáló információelméleti módszerek számos olyan módszertani hiányosságból szenvedtek, amelyek nyitva hagyják azt a kérdést, hogy ez a magas szó-kezdeti informatika valójában a lexikon tulajdonsága, vagy egyszerűen a felismerés inkrementális természetének tárgya. Ebben a tanulmányban rámutatunk a szegmensek információs képességének összehasonlítására szolgáló módszerekben meglévő zavarokra, és számos új intézkedést mutatunk be, amelyek elkerülik ezeket a zavarokat. Ezeknek a zavaroknak az ellenőrzésekor még mindig több száz nyelven találunk bizonyítékot arra, hogy valóban van egy nyelvközi tendencia az információk szavakban történő első betöltésére.', 'kk': 'Адам сөздерді өңдеу және лексикалық қатынау психолингвистикалық зерттеулері сөздердің бастапқы және сөздердің соңғы сегменттерінің таңдау мүмкіндігін, мысалы, тыңдаушылардың (көп) қатынау мүмкіндігін немесе сөздердің (төмен Бұл "Wedel et al" (2019b) және басқа жерде тілдер кейінгі сөздермен бірнеше мәлімет беру үшін өзгертілді. Лексиконда бұл тенденцияларды орнату үшін мәлімет теоретикалық әдістері бірнеше методологиялық қауіпсіздерден қалды. Бұл жоғары сөздің бастапқы мәліметтік мәліметтік қасиеті лексикондың қасиеті немесе тек білім кө Бұл қағазда, біз бөліктердің мәліметті сөздің алдында және кейін сөздің мәліметтілігін салыстыру әдістерінде қайшылығын таңдап, бұл қайшылықтарды салыстыруға болады. Бұл қиындықтарды бақылағанда, біз әлі жүздеген тілдерде мәліметті алдын- ала жүктеу үшін көптеген тілдердің көптеген тенденциясы бар.', 'mk': 'Психолингистичките студии за процес на човечки зборови и лексички пристап обезбедуваат доволно докази за преферираната природа на зборовите-иницијални во споредба со зборовите-финални сегменти, на пример, во однос на вниманието обработено од слушачите (поголемо) или веројатноста на намалување Ова доведе до претпоставка-како во Wedel et al. (2019b), но заеднички на друго место-дека јазиците еволуираа за да обезбедат повеќе информации порано од подоцна. Информациски-теоретички методи за утврдување на такви тенденции во лексиконите страдаат од неколку методолошки недостатоци кои оставаат отворено прашањето дали оваа висока информативност со почеток на зборот всушност е сопственост на лексиконот или едноставно артефакт на incrementaлната природа на признавањето. In this paper, we point out the confounds in existing methods for comparing the informativeness of segments early in the word versus later in the word, and present several new measures that avoid these confounds.  When controlling for these confounds, we still find evidence across hundreds of languages that indeed there is a cross-linguistic tendency to front-load information in words.', 'it': "Gli studi psicolinguistici sull'elaborazione delle parole umane e sull'accesso lessicale forniscono ampie prove della natura preferita dei segmenti iniziali di parola rispetto ai segmenti finali di parola, ad esempio in termini di attenzione prestata dagli ascoltatori (maggiore) o della probabilità di riduzione da parte degli oratori (minore). Ciò ha portato alla congettura – come in Wedel et al. (2019b), ma comune altrove – che le lingue si sono evolute per fornire più informazioni prima a parole che in seguito. I metodi teoretici dell'informazione per stabilire tali tendenze nei lessici hanno sofferto di diverse carenze metodologiche che lasciano aperta la questione se questa alta informatività della parola iniziale sia effettivamente una proprietà del lessico o semplicemente un artefatto della natura incrementale del riconoscimento. In questo articolo, sottolineiamo i confound nei metodi esistenti per confrontare l'informatività dei segmenti all'inizio della parola rispetto a più tardi nella parola, e presentiamo diverse nuove misure che evitano questi confound. Quando controlliamo questi confusione, troviamo ancora prove in centinaia di lingue che effettivamente c'è una tendenza cross-linguistica a caricare le informazioni in parole.", 'lt': 'Psycholinguistic studies of human word processing and lexical access provide ample evidence of the preferred nature of word-initial versus word-final segments, e.g., in terms of attention paid by listeners (greater) or the likelihood of reduction by speakers (lower).  Dėl to buvo padaryta prielaida Wedel et al. (2019b), tačiau kitose šalyse bendra, kad kalbos išsivystė, kad ankstesniais nei vėliau žodžiais būtų teikiama daugiau informacijos. Informacijos ir teorijos metodai, kuriais siekiama nustatyti tokias lexikonų tendencijas, patyrė keletą metodologinių trūkumų, dėl kurių kyla klausimas, ar šis didelis žodžio pradinis informavimas iš tikrųjų yra lexikono savybė arba paprasčiausiai papildomo pripažinimo pobūdžio objektas. Šiame dokumente atkreipiame dėmesį į esamus metodus, kuriais galima palyginti segmentų informuotumą anksti žodžiu, o vėliau žodžiu, ir pateikiame keletą naujų priemonių, kuriomis išvengiama šių susipainiavimų. Kontroliuodami šiuos susipainiavimus vis dar randame įrodymų šimtuose kalbų, kad iš tikrųjų yra tarpkalbinė tendencija į išankstinę informacijos apkrovą žodžiais.', 'mt': 'Studji psikoloġiċi tal-ipproċessar tal-kliem tal-bniedem u l-aċċess lexiku jipprovdu evidenza biżżejjed tan-natura ppreferuta tas-segmenti tal-bidu tal-kliem meta mqabbla mal-aħħar tal-kliem, pereżempju, f’termini ta’ attenzjoni mogħtija mis-smigħ (akbar) jew il-probabbiltà ta’ tnaqqis mill-kelliema (aktar baxx). This has led to the conjecture-as in Wedel et al. (2019b), but common elsewhere-that languages have evolved to provide more information earlier in words than later.  Metodi ta’ informazzjoni-teoretika biex jiġu stabbiliti tendenzi bħal dawn fil-lexicons sofrew minn diversi nuqqasijiet metodoloġiċi li jħallu miftuħa l-kwistjoni ta’ jekk din l-informazzjoni inizjali bil-kelma għolja hijiex fil-fatt proprjetà tal-lexicon jew sempliċement artefatt tan-natura inkrementali tar-rikonoxximent. In this paper, we point out the confounds in existing methods for comparing the informativeness of segments early in the word versus later in the word, and present several new measures that avoid these confounds.  When controlling for these confounds, we still find evidence across hundreds of languages that indeed there is a cross-linguistic tendency to front-load information in words.', 'mn': 'Хүний үг үйлдвэрлэх болон лексикийн хандлагын психолингийн судалгаанууд үг эхлэх болон эцсийн хэсэг, жишээ нь сонсогчид (илүү) анхаарлаа төвлөрсөн эсвэл илтгэгчид багасгах боломжтой байх боломжтой байдлыг илэрхийлж байна. Энэ нь Wedel et al (2019b) гэх мэт төсөөллийн хувьд хүргэсэн. Гэхдээ бусад хэл нь дараагийн үгээс илүү өмнө илүү мэдээллийг өгөх боломжтой болсон. Лексикон дээр ийм төвөгтэй байдал байгуулахын тулд мэдээллийн теоретик артефактууд олон методологийн алдагдлын тухай асуудал нээлттэй байдаг. Энэ үг эхлээд мэдээллийн мэдээллийн байдал нь үнэндээ лексиконы хувьд эсвэл ганцхан хүлээн зөвхөн хүлээн з Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэсгүүдийн мэдээллийн мэдээллийг эхлээд харьцуулахын тулд оршиж байгаа арга замыг тайлбарлаж, дараа нь үгээр харьцуулахын тулд олон шинэ үйл ажиллагааг тайлбарлаж байна. Эдгээр алдагдлыг удирдах үед бид хэдэн зуун хэл дээр мөн хэл дээр мэдээллийг илгээх хэлбэрээр илүү олон хэлний хандлага байгааг харж байна.', 'ms': 'kajian psikologistik pemprosesan perkataan manusia dan akses leksikal memberikan bukti yang cukup mengenai sifat yang disukai bagi segmen perkataan awal melawan segmen perkataan akhir, cth. dalam terma perhatian yang diberikan oleh pendengar (lebih besar) atau kemungkinan pengurangan oleh pembicara (lebih rendah). Ini telah membawa kepada tekaan-seperti di Wedel et al. (2019b), tetapi biasa di tempat lain bahasa-bahasa telah berevolusi untuk menyediakan maklumat lebih awal dalam perkataan daripada kemudian. Kaedah maklumat-teori untuk menentukan kecenderungan tersebut dalam leksikon telah menderita dari beberapa kekurangan metodologi yang meninggalkan terbuka soalan sama ada maklumat awal perkataan ini sebenarnya sifat leksikon atau hanya artefakta sifat tambahan pengenalan. In this paper, we point out the confounds in existing methods for comparing the informativeness of segments early in the word versus later in the word, and present several new measures that avoid these confounds.  Apabila mengawal kekacauan ini, kita masih mencari bukti melalui ratusan bahasa bahasa yang sebenarnya terdapat cenderung saling bahasa untuk muat awal maklumat dalam perkataan.', 'ka': 'მეცნიერი სიტყვების პროცესი და ლექსიკალური დამატების პროცესი სიტყვების პროცესი და პროცესიკური დამატების პროცესი პირველი სიტყვების პროცესის პროცესი პროცესი და სიტყვების დასაწყვების პროცესი, მა ეს იქნება კონექექტურაში, როგორც Wedel et al. (2019b), მაგრამ საერთო ადგილად, რომ ენები განვითარებულია, რომ უფრო მეტი ინფორმაცია სიტყვებში უფრო წინ იქნება, ვიდრე შემ ინფორმაცია-ტეორეტიკური მეთოდიები, რომლებიც ლექსიკონში ასეთი ტენდენციების შესაძლებელად განვითარება, რამდენიმე მეთოდიოლოგიური შესაძლებლობებიდან გახსნა კითხვის გახსნა თუ არა ეს დიდი სიტყვის ინფორმატიკური ინფ ამ დომენტში ჩვენ აჩვენებთ კონფიგურაციას სექსენტური მეტოვებში, რომელიც სექსენტურად სიტყვის ინფორმატიფიკაციას გადასწორებლად სიტყვის შემდეგ, და აჩვენებთ რამდენიმე ახალი მო როდესაც ამ კონტროლექციების კონტროლექცია, ჩვენ უკვე ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან სიტყვებით წარმოიდგინეთ, რომ სიტყვებით კრონტროლური', 'pl': 'Psychojęzyczne badania nad przetwarzaniem tekstu ludzkiego i dostępem leksykalnym dostarczają wystarczających dowodów na preferowany charakter segmentów słowo-początkowych a słowo-końcowych, np. pod względem uwagi zwracanej przez słuchaczy (większego) lub prawdopodobieństwa redukcji przez mówców (niższego). Doprowadziło to do domniemania – jak w Wedel et al. (2019b), ale powszechne gdzie indziej – że języki ewoluowały, aby dostarczać więcej informacji wcześniej niż później. Metody informacyjno-teoretyczne służące ustaleniu takich tendencji w leksykonach doznały kilku niedociągnięć metodologicznych, które pozostawiają otwarte pytanie, czy ta wysoka informacyjność słowo-początkowa jest rzeczywiście właściwością leksykonu, czy po prostu artefaktem przyrostowego charakteru rozpoznawania. W niniejszym artykule wskazujemy na zakłócenia w istniejących metodach porównywania informacyjności segmentów na początku słowa z późniejszym w słowie oraz przedstawiamy kilka nowych środków, które unikają tych zakłóceń. Kontrolując te zakłócenia, wciąż znajdujemy dowody w setkach języków, że rzeczywiście istnieje tendencja między językami do przedłużania informacji w słowach.', 'ml': 'മനുഷ്യരുടെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെയും ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d സമ്പാദിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെയും സൈക്കോലിഗ്ലിസ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെയും മുന്\u200dപ്  This has led to the conjecture-as in Wedel et al. (2019b), but common elsewhere-that languages have evolved to provide more information earlier in words than later.  ലെക്സിക്കനിലെ ഇങ്ങനെയുള്ള സ്വഭാവങ്ങള്\u200d സ്ഥാപിക്കാനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d തിയോറിറ്റിക്ക് രീതികളില്\u200d നിന്നും കഷ്ടപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ വാക്കിന്റെ ആദ്യ വിവ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികളില്\u200d നാം കാണിക്കുന്നു. വാക്കില്\u200d വിഭാഗത്തിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d തുല്യമാക്കുന്നതിനു ശേഷം വാക്കില്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ത ഈ ഭാഷകളെ നിയന്ത്രിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d നൂറുകണക്കിന് ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും തെളിവുകള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു. വാക്കുകളില്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d മുന്നില', 'no': 'Psykolinguiske studiar om menneskelig ordbehandling og leksisk tilgang gjev ample beviser om den førre naturen av ord-opphavet mot ordende segmentar, f.eks. med oppmerksomheten betalt av lytarar (større) eller sannsynligheten for reduksjon av talerar (lågare). Dette har ført til konjeksjonen som i Wedel et al. (2019b), men vanleg andre stader, at språka har utvikla for å gjera meir informasjon tidlegare i ord enn seinare. Informasjon-teoretiske metodar for å setja opp slike tendenser i leksikon har fått frå fleire metodologiske manglar som let opna spørsmålet om denne høg ordoppgåve informativitet er faktisk ein eigenskap av leksikon eller enkelt ein artefakt av den økende gjenkjenning. I denne papiret viser vi konfliktene i eksisterande metodar for å sammenligne informativitet av segmenta tidlegare i ordet mot seinare i ordet, og presenterer fleire nye tiltak som unngår disse konfliktene. Når vi kontrollerer desse konfliktene, finn vi fortsatt beviser over hundre språk at det faktisk finst ein krysslingstendens til å lasta informasjon fram i ord.', 'ro': 'Studiile psihologistice privind prelucrarea textelor umane și accesul lexical oferă dovezi ample ale naturii preferate a segmentelor de cuvânt-inițial versus cuvânt-final, de exemplu în ceea ce privește atenția acordată de ascultători (mai mare) sau probabilitatea reducerii de către vorbitori (mai mică). Acest lucru a condus la presupunerea – ca în Wedel et al. (2019b), dar comună în altă parte – că limbile au evoluat pentru a oferi mai multe informații mai devreme în cuvinte decât mai târziu. Metodele teoretice ale informaţiei pentru stabilirea acestor tendinţe în lexicoane au suferit de mai multe deficienţe metodologice care lasă deschisă întrebarea dacă această informativitate iniţială de cuvânt ridicată este de fapt o proprietate a lexiconului sau pur şi simplu un artefact al naturii incrementale a recunoaşterii. În această lucrare, subliniem confuziile în metodele existente pentru compararea informativității segmentelor la începutul cuvântului față de ulteriorul cuvântului și prezentăm câteva noi măsuri care evită aceste confuzii. Atunci când controlăm aceste confuzii, încă găsim dovezi în sute de limbi că, într-adevăr, există o tendință cross-lingvistică de a încărca informațiile în cuvinte.', 'sr': 'Psihološko proučavanje ljudskih reči obrađivanja riječi i leksički pristup pružaju dosta dokaza o preferiranoj prirodi riječi-početnih i riječi-konačnih segmenta, na primjer, u smislu pažnje koje slušaju (veće) ili verovatnoće smanjenja govornika (niže). To je dovelo do pretpostavke kao u Wedel et al. (2019b), ali zajedničkog drugog mesta, da su jezici evoluirali kako bi davali više informacija ranije nego kasnije. Informativne teorijske metode za uspostavljanje takvih tendencija u leksikonovima patile su od nekoliko metodoloških nedostataka koje ostavljaju otvoreno pitanje da li je ova visoka informativnost riječi-početna informativnost zapravo vlasništvo leksiona ili samo artefakt povećane prirode priznanja. U ovom papiru, pokazujemo sukobe postojećim metodama za usporedbu informativnosti segmenta ranije u reči i kasnije u reči, i predstavljamo nekoliko novih mjera koje izbjegavaju te sukobe. Kada kontrolišemo te konflikte, još uvek pronađemo dokaze na stotine jezika da postoji krsno jezička tendencija za preopterećenje informacija rečima.', 'ta': 'மனித வார்த்தை செயல்படுத்துதல் மற்றும் லெக்சிக் அணுகல் முன்னிருப்பு வார்த்தையின் முதல் வார்த்தை - இறுதி துண்டத்திற்கு முன்னிருப்பு விருப்பமான தெளிவா இது வெடெல் எட் அலில் உள்ள யோசனையாக இருந்தது, ஆனால் பொதுவான மொழிகள் பின்னர் வார்த்தைகளில் மேலும் தகவலை கொடுக்க வேண்டும் என்ற லெக்சிக்ஸில் இத்தகைய செயல்பாடுகளை உறுதிப்படுத்த தகவல் திடீரிய முறைமைகள் பல முறைமையான சுருக்கங்களிலிருந்து பாதிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளன. இந்த உயரமான வார்த்தை திறந்த In this paper, we point out the confounds in existing methods for comparing the informativeness of segments early in the word versus later in the word, and present several new measures that avoid these confounds.  When controlling for these confounds, we still find evidence across hundreds of languages that indeed there is a cross-linguistic tendency to front-load information in words.', 'sv': 'Psykoslingvistiska studier av mänsklig ordbehandling och lexikal tillgång ger gott om bevis på den föredragna karaktären av ordinitiala respektive ordslutliga segment, t.ex. när det gäller lyssnarnas uppmärksamhet (större) eller sannolikheten för att talarna minskar (lägre). Detta har lett till antagandet – som i Wedel m.fl. (2019b), men vanligt på annat håll – att språk har utvecklats för att ge mer information tidigare i ord än senare. Informationsteoretiska metoder för att fastställa sådana tendenser i lexikon har drabbats av flera metodologiska brister som lämnar öppen frågan om denna höga ordinitiala informativitet faktiskt är en egenskap av lexikonet eller helt enkelt en artefakt av erkännandets inkrementella natur. I denna uppsats pekar vi på förväxlingarna i befintliga metoder för att jämföra informativiteten hos segment tidigt i ordet jämfört med senare i ordet, och presenterar flera nya åtgärder för att undvika dessa förväxlingar. När vi kontrollerar dessa förvirringar hittar vi fortfarande bevis på hundratals språk att det faktiskt finns en tvärspråklig tendens att frontlista information i ord.', 'si': 'Psykolinguistic studies of Human word processing and lexicalal Access are Amplic සාක්ෂියක් දෙන්නේ වචන-පටන් ගත්ත ස්වභාවිතයේ වචන-පටන් ගත්ත වෙනුවෙන් වචන-අන්තිම වෙනුවෙන් අවස්ථාව, උදාහරණයෙන්,  මේක වුඩෙල් ට් ල් වලින් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් (2019b), නමුත් අනිත් වලින් භාෂාවල් පස්සේ වචන වලට වඩා තොරතුරු දෙන්න පු තොරතුරු සාධාරණික විද්\u200dයාවය ලෙක්සිකෝන්ස් වලින් එහෙම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස්ථාපනය කරන්න සිද්ධ විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාවයෙන් සිද්ධ වෙලා තියෙනවා කියලා ප මේ පත්තරේදී, අපි ප්\u200dරතිශ්න විදියට ප්\u200dරතිශ්න විදියට ප්\u200dරතිශ්න විදියට ප්\u200dරතිශ්න විදියට ප්\u200dරතිශ්න විදියට පස්සේ වචනයේ විද මේ විශාල විදිහට පාලනය කරන්න, අපි තවමත් භාෂාවල් සියළුවක් හොයාගන්න සාක්ෂියක් හොයාගන්නවා කියලා ඇත්තටම වචන වල', 'so': "Waxbarashada cilmiga dhimirka ah e e baaritaanka hadalka dadka iyo isticmaalka leksikada waxay bixiyaan cadeyn badan oo ay u suurtowdaan dabiicadda hore ee hadalka ka ka gees ah qaybaha ugu dambeeya ee hadalka, tusaale ahaan loo jeedo dhegayaasha (ka weyn) ama suurtagalka ka nusqaamiyo hadallada (hoose). Tan waxaa sababtay malaha ku saabsan Wedel et al (2019b), laakiin luqadaha kale oo kala duduwan waxay u hormaray inay macluumaad dheeraad ah ku siiyaan hadallada hore. Macluumaad-theoretical methodology in la xaqiijiyo dabeecada leksikanka ayaa ka xanuunsaday qaar dhinaca dhaqdhaqaaq ah oo ka taga su'aalka inay furaan warqadan hore ee macluumaadka, taasi waa hanti u ah leksikaanka ama waxaa keliyahoo'a an ka tirsan dabiicadda aqoonsiga kordhinta. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku qoraynaa qaababka joogta oo aan isbarbardhigno aqoonta qeybaha hore ee ugu horraysa hadalka oo ka dambeeya, waxaynu soo bandhignaa qiyaastii cusub oo ka ilaalinaya qasnadahan. Marka aan u maamulno hababkan, waxaynu weli helaynaa caddeyn boqolaal luuqadood oo kala duduwan, sida runta ah waxaa jira xaalad luqad kala duduwan oo ku qoran hadalka hore.", 'ur': 'انسان کی کلمات پردازی اور لکھی دسترسی کے ذریعے روانی زبان کی تحقیقات میں بہت سی نشانیاں دیتے ہیں کلمات کی ترجیح والی نسبت کلمات-پایانی قسمتوں کی، مثال، سننے والوں کے ذریعے (بہت زیادہ) یا کلمات کے ذریعے (نیچے) کمی کی امکان سے۔ اس نے ویڈل اور ال (2019b) کی تصور کی طرح کی ہے، لیکن دوسری جگہ، یہ زبانیں اگلوں سے پہلے کلمات سے زیادہ اطلاعات دینے کے لئے تغییر کی ہیں۔ لیکسونز میں ایسی تدبیروں کی تعمیر کرنے کے لئے اطلاعات-نظریاتی طریقے بہت سی مثالی تدبیروں سے دردناک ہیں جن میں سوال کھول رہی ہے کہ کیا یہ بلند کلمات-آغاز معلومات واقعی لکسونز کی ایک مالک ہے یا صرف پہچان جانے کی اضافہ کی آثار ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم موجود طریقوں میں مخالفت کو دکھاتے ہیں کہ کلام کے آگے اور بعد کلام کے آگے دکھاتے ہیں اور بہت سی نو اندازے ظاہر کرتے ہیں جو ان مخالفت سے روکتے ہیں۔ جب ان آہٹوں کے لئے کنٹرول کرتے ہیں، ہم ابھی سونے زبانوں میں نشانیاں پاتے ہیں کہ یقیناً کلمات سے پہلے لوڈ کی اطلاعات کے لئے ایک مختلف زبان کی تنظیم ہے۔', 'vi': "Các nghiên cứu ngôn ngữ cách chấp thuật người và tiếp tục thức cung cấp những dấu về tích thứ ưa thích của phân khu vực chữ'bắt nhật'so với những phân khu vực cuối chứng thái, v.v. v. v. v. v. Việc này đã dẫn đến dự án như ở Wedel et al. (bộ 9b), nhưng phổ biến ở nơi khác mà ngôn ngữ đã phát triển để cung cấp thông tin tức từ từ sớm hơn. Những phương pháp định lý thông tin để xác định xu hướng đó trong ngôn ngữ học đã phải chịu đựng nhiều thiếu sót về phương pháp về phương pháp mà để lại cho câu hỏi liệu từ đầu cao này có thực sự thuộc về ngôn ngữ hay đơn giản là do tính phức tạp của sự nhận dạng. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi chỉ ra sự xáo trộn trong các phương pháp có sẵn để so sánh tính khí của các phân đoạn đầu từ so với sau này trong từ, và đưa ra một số phương pháp mới để tránh sự xáo trộn này. Trong việc kiểm soát những sự xáo trộn này, chúng ta vẫn tìm thấy bằng chứng trên hàng trăm ngôn ngữ rằng thực tế có một xu hướng ngôn ngữ khác nhau để nói bằng lời.", 'uz': "Inson soʻzni boshqarish va leksikal murojaat qilish orqali o'xshash so'zlarning birinchi so'zni boshqarish imkoniyatini ko'plab beradi, masalan tinglovchilar (ko'proq) va gapiruvchilar (chindan) kamaytirish imkoniyatini ko'rsatadi. Bu biz Wedel et al (2019b) degan g'oyalarini o'zgartiradi, lekin boshqa tillar o'zgarishdan oldin so'zlardan ham ko'proq maʼlumot yordam beradi. Leksizlarga bu shakllarni aniqlash uchun maʼlumot teoretik usullari bir necha metodiya qisqartmalaridan qo'shiladi. Bu eng yuqori ma'lumot, balki leksika ma'lumotning xossalari, yoki tashkilotni tashkil qilish imkoniyatining artekti. Bu qogʻozda, biz bu so'zning birinchi so'zda qismlarning haqida o'xshash ma'lumotlarni o'rganish uchun mavjud usullarni anglatamiz, va bu bir necha qanday takliflarni eslab qolish mumkin. When controlling for these confounds, we still find evidence across hundreds of languages that indeed there is a cross-linguistic tendency to front-load information in words.", 'bg': 'Психолингвистичните изследвания на човешката текстообработка и лексикалния достъп предоставят достатъчно доказателства за предпочитания характер на първоначалните думи спрямо крайните текстови сегменти, например по отношение на вниманието, отделено от слушателите (по-голямо) или вероятността от намаляване от говорещите (по-ниско). Това е довело до предположението – както и в Уедъл и др. (2019б), но често срещано другаде – че езиците са еволюирали, за да предоставят повече информация по-рано с думи, отколкото по-късно. Информационно-теоретичните методи за установяване на такива тенденции в лексиконите страдат от няколко методологични недостатъци, които оставят отворен въпросът дали тази висока първоначална информативност на думата всъщност е свойство на лексикона или просто артефакт от нарастващия характер на разпознаването. В настоящата статия посочваме объркванията в съществуващите методи за сравняване на информативността на сегментите в началото на думата спрямо по-късно в думата и представяме няколко нови мерки, които избягват тези обърквания. Когато контролираме тези обърквания, все още намираме доказателства в стотици езици, че наистина има междулингвистична тенденция да зареждаме информацията отпред с думи.', 'da': 'Psykolingistiske undersøgelser af menneskelig tekstbehandling og leksikalsk adgang giver rigelige beviser på den foretrukne karakter af ord-initial versus ord-endelige segmenter, f.eks. med hensyn til opmærksomhed fra lytterne (større) eller sandsynligheden for reduktion af talerne (lavere). Dette har ført til den formodning - som i Wedel et al. (2019b), men almindelige andre steder - at sprog har udviklet sig til at give mere information tidligere i ord end senere. Informationsteoretiske metoder til at fastlægge sådanne tendenser i leksikoner har lidt under flere metodologiske mangler, der lader spørgsmålet stå åbent om, hvorvidt denne høje ord-initial informativitet rent faktisk er en egenskab af leksikonen eller blot et artefakt af den inkrementelle karakter af anerkendelse. I denne artikel påpeger vi forvirringerne i eksisterende metoder til at sammenligne informativiteten af segmenter tidligt i ordet versus senere i ordet, og præsenterer flere nye foranstaltninger, der undgår disse forvirringer. Når vi kontrollerer for disse forvirringer, finder vi stadig beviser på hundredvis af sprog, at der faktisk er en tværsproget tendens til at frontloade information i ord.', 'nl': 'Psycholinguïstische studies van menselijke tekstverwerking en lexicale toegang leveren voldoende bewijs voor de voorkeur van woord-initiële versus woord-laatste segmenten, bijvoorbeeld in termen van aandacht besteed door luisteraars (groter) of de waarschijnlijkheid van vermindering door sprekers (lager). Dit heeft geleid tot het vermoeden – zoals in Wedel et al. (2019b), maar elders gebruikelijk – dat talen zijn geëvolueerd om eerder in woorden dan later meer informatie te verstrekken. Informatietheoretische methoden om dergelijke tendensen in lexicons vast te stellen hebben te kampen gehad met verschillende methodologische tekortkomingen die de vraag openstellen of deze hoge woord-initiële informatiekracht daadwerkelijk een eigenschap van het lexicon is of gewoon een artefact van de incrementele aard van erkenning. In dit artikel wijzen we op de confounds in bestaande methoden voor het vergelijken van de informatiekracht van segmenten vroeg in het woord versus later in het woord, en presenteren we verschillende nieuwe maatregelen die deze confounds vermijden. Wanneer we deze verwarring controleren, vinden we nog steeds bewijs in honderden talen dat er inderdaad een cross-linguïstische tendens is om informatie in woorden te laden.', 'hr': 'Psihološka ispitivanja obrađivanja ljudskih riječi i leksički pristup pružaju dosta dokaza o preferiranoj prirodi riječi-početnih i riječi-konačnih segmenta, npr. u smislu pažnje obraćene slušatelji (većim) ili vjerojatnosti smanjenja govornika (niže). To je dovelo do pretpostavke kao u Wedel et al. (2019b), ali zajedničkog drugdje-da su jezici evoluirali kako bi davali više informacija ranije u riječima nego kasnije. Informativne teorijske metode za uspostavljanje takvih tendencija u leksikonima patile su od nekoliko metodoloških nedostataka koje ostavljaju otvoreno pitanje da li je ova visoka informativnost riječi-početna informativnost zapravo vlasništvo leksiona ili samo artefakt povećane prirode priznanja. U ovom papiru pokazujemo sukobe postojećim metodama za usporedbu informativnosti segmenta ranije u riječi protiv riječi kasnije u riječi i predstavljamo nekoliko novih mjera koje izbjegavaju te sukobe. Kada kontrolišemo te konflikte, još uvijek pronalazimo dokaze na stotine jezika da postoji krsno jezička tendencija za predopterećenje informacija riječima.', 'de': 'Psycholingustische Studien der menschlichen Textverarbeitung und des lexikalischen Zugangs liefern reichlich Beweise für die bevorzugte Natur von Wort-Anfangs- und Wort-Endsegmenten, z.B. in Bezug auf die Aufmerksamkeit der Zuhörer (größer) oder die Wahrscheinlichkeit der Reduktion durch Sprecher (niedriger). Dies hat zur Vermutung geführt – wie in Wedel et al. (2019b), aber anderswo üblich –, dass Sprachen sich entwickelt haben, um früher als später mehr Informationen in Worten bereitzustellen. Informationstheoretische Methoden zur Etablierung solcher Tendenzen in Lexikonen weisen mehrere methodische Mängel auf, die die Frage offen lassen, ob diese hohe wortinitiale Informationsfähigkeit tatsächlich eine Eigenschaft des Lexikons oder einfach ein Artefakt des inkrementellen Charakters der Erkennung ist. In diesem Beitrag zeigen wir die Konfounds in bestehenden Methoden auf, um die Informativität von Segmenten früh im Wort mit später im Wort zu vergleichen, und stellen mehrere neue Maßnahmen vor, die diese Konfounds vermeiden. Bei der Kontrolle dieser Konfounds finden wir immer noch Beweise in Hunderten von Sprachen, dass tatsächlich eine sprachübergreifende Tendenz besteht, Informationen in Wörtern frontload zu geben.', 'ko': '인류의 어휘 처리와 어휘가 통달한 심리언어학 연구에 대량의 증거를 제공하여 어수와 어미 부분의 선호성을 증명했다. 예를 들어 듣는 사람의 주의력(더 높음)이나 말하는 사람이 주의력을 줄일 가능성(더 낮음)을 증명했다.이로 인해 웨델 등(Wedel et al.(2019b)의 추측이 제기됐지만, 다른 곳에서는 단어에서 더 많은 정보를 더 일찍 제공하기 위해 언어가 진화한 것이 흔하다.어휘에서 이러한 경향을 세우는 정보론 방법은 몇 가지 방법의 결함이 있는데 이것은 현안으로 남아 있다. 즉, 이런 고도의 단어의 초기 정보량은 도대체 어휘의 한 속성인지, 아니면 인지증량성의 한 산물인지이다.본고에서 우리는 기존의 단어의 초기와 후기 단편 정보량을 비교하는 방법에 존재하는 곤혹을 지적하고 이러한 곤혹을 피하는 몇 가지 새로운 조치를 제시했다.이러한 곤혹을 통제할 때, 우리는 여전히 수백 개의 언어에서 증거를 찾았는데, 이는 단어에 정보를 미리 불러오는 크로스 언어 경향이 확실히 존재한다는 것을 보여준다.', 'fa': 'تحقیقات روانشناسی روانشناسی از پرداخت کلمات انسان و دسترسی زبانی مدرک بسیار از طبیعت ترجیح دادن کلمات-اولیه نسبت به بخش\u200cهای نهایی کلمات، مثال در مورد توجه توسط گوش\u200cدهندگان (بیشتر) یا احتمال کاهش توسط صحبت\u200cکنندگان (پایین) است. این باعث شد به فرضیه\u200cای که در ویدل و آل (۲۰۱۹b) بوده باشد، ولی به جای دیگر معمولی که زبانها پیش از این به کلمات بیشتری اطلاعات داده باشند. روش\u200cهای اطلاعات و نظریه\u200cای برای ایجاد چنین روش\u200cها در لکسیون از چندین ناتوانی\u200cهای روش\u200cشناسی رنج می\u200cبرند که سوال را باز می\u200cگذارند که آیا این اولین اطلاعات\u200cشناسی کلمه بالا در واقع یک دارایی از لکسیون است یا ساده\u200cای از طبیعت افزایش\u200cشناسی است. در این کاغذ، ما در روش\u200cهای موجود مختلف را برای مقایسه کردن اطلاعات بخش\u200cها در ابتداً در کلمه نسبت به بعداً در کلمه اشاره می\u200cکنیم، و چندین اندازه\u200cهای جدید را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که از این مختلف دور می\u200cشوند. وقتی کنترل این پیچیدگی\u200cها را کنترل می\u200cکنیم، ما هنوز مدرک\u200cهایی را در صدها زبان پیدا می\u200cکنیم که در حقیقت یک نقشه\u200cای از زبان\u200cهای متفاوتی برای بار اطلاعات پیش\u200cباری به کلمات وجود دارد.', 'id': 'Studi psikologis proses kata manusia dan akses leksikal memberikan bukti yang cukup tentang sifat yang disukai dari segmen kata-awal versus kata-akhir, misalnya, dalam terma perhatian yang diberikan oleh pendengar (lebih besar) atau kemungkinan reduksi oleh pembicara (lebih rendah). Ini telah menyebabkan perkiraan-seperti di Wedel et al. (2019b), tetapi umum di tempat lain bahasa-bahasa telah berevolusi untuk memberikan lebih banyak informasi lebih awal dalam kata-kata daripada kemudian. Metode informasi-teori untuk menentukan tendensi tersebut dalam leksikon telah menderita dari beberapa kekurangan metodologi yang meninggalkan terbuka pertanyaan apakah informasi awal kata tinggi ini sebenarnya adalah properti dari leksikon atau hanya artefakta dari alam incremental pengenalan. In this paper, we point out the confounds in existing methods for comparing the informativeness of segments early in the word versus later in the word, and present several new measures that avoid these confounds.  Ketika mengendalikan kekacauan ini, kita masih menemukan bukti melalui ratusan bahasa bahwa sesungguhnya ada cenderung saling bahasa untuk memuat informasi depan dalam kata-kata.', 'sw': 'Tafiti za lugha za kisaikolojia za upasuaji wa maneno ya binadamu na upatikanaji wa kimaikolojia zinatoa ushahidi mkubwa wa ubunifu wa awali wa neno tofauti na vipengele vya mwisho vya maneno, kwa mfano, kwa maana ya kusikilizwa na wasikilizaji (zaidi) au uwezekano wa kupunguza na wazungumzaji (chini). Hili limesababisha dhana kama ilivyokuwa Wedel et al. (2019b), lakini lugha nyinginezo zimeendelea ili kutoa taarifa zaidi zilizopita kwa maneno zaidi ya baadae. mbinu za nadharia za taarifa za kuanzisha tabia kama hizi nchini lexico zimesababisha kutokana na upungufu wa njia mbalimbali ambazo zinaacha wazi swali la ikiwa taarifa hizi za kwanza za za neno hilo ni mali ya lexico au ni ukweli wa ukweli wa hali ya kutambuliwa. Katika karatasi hii, tunaonyesha tofauti zilizopo katika njia za kulinganisha taarifa za vipengele mapema katika neno hilo na baadae katika neno hilo, na kuweka hatua mpya zinazojitenga na yale yanayohusiana na haya. Wakati utawala wa a in a hii, bado tunapata ushahidi katika mamia ya lugha kwamba kwa hakika kuna tendo la lugha mbalimbali la kupata taarifa za mbele kwa maneno.', 'af': "Psycholinguistic studies of menslike woordeverwerking en leksiese toegang verskaf ample getuienis van die voorkeur natuur van woord-inisiale teen woord-final e segmente, bv. in terms of aandag gegee deur luisters (groter) of die waarskynlik van reduksie deur sprekkers (onder). Hierdie het gelei na die verwerking-as in Wedel et al. (2019b), maar gemeenskap in ander plek-dat tale ontwikkel het om meer inligting te verskaf vroeër in woorde as later. Informasie-teorieese metodes om sodanige tendensies in leksikone te stel het gely van verskeie metodologiese kortpad wat die vraag oop laat maak of hierdie hoë woord-inisiale informatiwiteit eintlik 'n eienskap van die leksikon of eenvoudig 'n artefaktie van die inkremensielike natuur van herken is. In hierdie papier, wys ons die skande in bestaande metodes vir vergelyking van die informatiwiteit van segmente vroeg in die woord teen later in die woord, en voorsien verskeie nuwe maatjies wat hierdie skande verlos. Wanneer ons vir hierdie skande beheer, vind ons nog bevestigheid oor honderd tale dat daar sekerlik 'n kruislingvisse tendensie is om inligting in woorde voor te laai.", 'sq': 'Psycholinguistic studies of human word processing and lexical access provide ample evidence of the preferred nature of word-initial versus word-final segments, e.g., in terms of attention paid by listeners (greater) or the likelihood of reduction by speakers (lower).  Kjo ka shpjerë në supozimin-si në Wedel et al. (2019b), por të përbashkët diku tjetër-se gjuhët kanë evoluar për të dhënë më shumë informacion më parë në fjalë se më vonë. Metodat informacion-teorike për të vendosur tendenca të tilla në leksikone kanë vuajtur nga disa mungesa metodologjike që lënë të hapura pyetjen nëse kjo informacionalitet e lartë fjalë-fillim është në fakt një pronë e leksikonit apo thjesht një artefakt i natyrës shtesë të njohjes. In this paper, we point out the confounds in existing methods for comparing the informativeness of segments early in the word versus later in the word, and present several new measures that avoid these confounds.  Kur kontrollojmë për këto konfuzione, ne ende gjejmë prova nëpër qindra gjuhë se në të vërtetë ka një tendencë ndërgjuhësore për të ngarkuar përpara informacionin me fjalë.', 'az': 'İnsan sözlərin işləməsi və leksik əlaqəsi barəsindəki psikololiki təhsil sözlərin başlanğıcının və sözlərin sonlarındakı segmentlərin seçilmiş təhsilinin çox dəlillərini bəyan edir, məsələn dinləyənlərin (daha böyük) və danışanların (daha yuxarı) azaltması mümkün olmasına g örədir. Bu, Wedel et al. (2019b) adlı zənnə yolu göstərdi, amma başqa yerlərdə idilər daha əvvəl sözlərdən daha çox məlumat vermək üçün dəyişmişdir. Leksikonlarda böyük tərzlərini təsdiqləmək üçün məlumat-teoriki yolları çoxlu metodolojik tərzlərindən üz vermişdir ki, bu yüksək söz-başlanğıç informativlik əslində leksikon mülküsü və ya ancaq tanınmaq tərzlərinin artefakti olduğunu soruşur. Bu kağızda, sözlərdən əvvəl və sonrakı sözlərə qarşılaşdırmaq üçün məskənin metodlarında qarışıqlıqları göstərir və bu qarışıqlıqlardan çəkinən neçə-neçə yeni ölçüləri göstəririk. Bu çətinliklərə müdafiə edərkən, biz hələ yüzlərlə dillərdə kanıt tapırıq ki, sözlərlə əvvəl yüklənmək üçün çox dilli məlumat var.', 'hy': 'Psycholinguistic studies of human word processing and lexical access provide ample evidence of the preferred nature of word-initial versus word-final segments, e.g., in terms of attention paid by listeners (greater) or the likelihood of reduction by speakers (lower).  Սա հանգեցրեց այն ենթադրությանը, որը տեղի է ունենում Հերդել և այլներում (2019b), բայց տարբեր լեզուներն են զարգացել, որպեսզի ավելի շուտ տեղեկատվություն տրամադրեն բառերով քան ավելի ուշ: Տեղեկատվական-տեսական մեթոդները լեքսիկոնների այդպիսի հակվածությունների հաստատելու համար տառապվել են մի քանի մեթոդոլոգիական թերություններից, որոնք բաց-սկզբնական ինֆորմատիվությունը բառի վրա բաց-սկզբնական ինֆորմատիվությունը իրականում լեքսիկոնի հատկություն է, կամ պարզապես ճանաչու Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նշում ենք բառի սկզբնական ինֆորմատիվությունը համեմատելու գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդների խառնաշփոթները, և ներկայացնում ենք մի քանի նոր միջոցներ, որոնք խուսափում են այդ խառնաշփոթներից: Երբ վերահսկում ենք այս խառնաշփոթները, մենք դեռևս գտնում ենք ապացույցներ հարյուրավոր լեզուներում, որ իսկապես գոյություն ունի լեզվաբանական հակվածություն բառերով տեղեկատվություն առաջնաբեռնելու համար:', 'am': 'የሲኮልቋንቋዊ ትምህርት የሰው ቃላት ማቀናቀል እና የሌክሲካዊ መግለጫ የቃላት መጀመሪያ ከቃላት-መጨረሻ ክፍሎች የተመረጠውን ማስረጃዎችን ያሳያል፤ ምሳሌ ሰሚዎች (የበለጠ) ወይም በተናገሩ (ታናሽ) የሚያሳስቆይ ምናልባት ነው፡፡ ይህም በዌዴል ቴል አል (2019b) የሚደረገውን አሳብ አግኝቷል፣ ነገር ግን ከኋለኛው ንግግር ይልቅ የሚበልጠውን መረጃ ለመስጠት በተለየ ሌላ ቋንቋዎች ተለይተዋል፡፡ Information-theoretic methods to establish such tendencies in lexicons have suffered from several methodological shortcomings that leave open the question of whether this high word-initial informativeness is actually a property of the lexicon or simply an artefact of the incremental nature of recognition.  በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ በአሁኑ ደረጃዎች ያሉትን የአካባቢዎች ማስታወቂያውን በመጀመሪያ ቃላት በተቃላት በተቃወሙ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ እነዚህን ተቃውሞ ሲቆጣጠር በመቶ ቋንቋዎች ላይ ማስረጃዎችን እናገኛለን፡፡', 'bn': 'Psycholinguistic studies of human word processing and lexical access provide ample evidence of the preferred nature of word-initial versus word-final segments, e.g., in terms of attention paid by listeners (greater) or the likelihood of reduction by speakers (lower).  এই ধারণার ফলে উইদেলেট আল (২০১৯)। কিন্তু সাধারণ ভাষাগুলো পরের চেয়ে বেশী তথ্য প্রদান করার জন্য সাধারণ ভাষাগুলো বেড়ে গেছে। লেক্সিকোর এই ধরনের প্রচণ্ড প্রতিষ্ঠানের তথ্য-থিওরিক পদ্ধতি বেশ কয়েকটি পদ্ধতিগত সংক্রান্ত ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত হয়েছে যারা এই উচ্চ শব্দ-প্রাথমিক তথ্য প্রশ্ন খুলে দেয় এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতিতে বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন তথ্য তুলনা করার জন্য উল্লেখ করি শব্দের প্রতি পরবর্তীতে বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন এগুলো নিয়ন্ত্রণ করার সময় আমরা এখনো শত শত ভাষায় প্রমাণ পাই যে শব্দের সামনে তথ্য লোড করার ক্ষেত্রে ক্রিস্ট্রিভাষিক প্রতিভাব রয়েছে।', 'bs': 'Psihološka ispitivanja ljudskih obrazovanja riječi i leksički pristup pružaju dosta dokaza o preferiranoj prirodi riječi-početnih i riječi-konačnih segmenta, na primjer, u smislu pažnje koje slušaju (veće) ili vjerojatnosti smanjenja govornika (niže). To je dovelo do pretpostavke kao u Wedel et al. (2019b), ali zajedničkog drugdje-da su jezici evoluirali kako bi davali više informacija ranije nego kasnije. Informativne teorijske metode za uspostavljanje takvih tendencija u leksikonima patile su od nekoliko metodoloških nedostataka koje ostavljaju otvoreno pitanje da li je ova visoka informativnost riječi-početna informativnost zapravo vlasništvo leksiona ili samo artefakt povećane prirode priznanja. U ovom papiru, ukazujemo na sukobe postojećim metodama za usporedbu informativnosti segmenta ranije u reči protiv riječi kasnije u reči, i predstavljamo nekoliko novih mjera koje izbjegavaju te sukobe. Kada kontrolišemo ove konflikte, još uvijek nađemo dokaze na stotine jezika da postoji krsno jezička tendencija za predopterećenje informacija riječima.', 'ca': "Els estudis psicològics sobre el processament de paraules humanes i l'accés lèxic proporcionen amples proves de la naturalesa preferida dels segments de paraules inicials en comparació amb els segments de paraules finals, per exemple en termes d'atenció prestada pels escoltants (més gran) o la probabilitat de reducció pels oradors (més baix). Això ha portat a la conjectura de Wedel et al. (2019b), però comunes en altres llocs que les llengües han evolucionat per proporcionar més informació abans de paraules que després. Els mètodes teòrics d'informació per establir aquestes tendències en els lexicons han patit de diverses deficiències metodològices que deixan obertes la qüestió de si aquesta alta informacivitat inicial de paraules és realment una propietat del lexicó o simplement un artefacte de la naturalesa incremental del reconeixement. En aquest article, observem les confusions en els mètodes existents per comparar la informacionalitat dels segments primer a la paraula i després a la paraula, i presentem diverses noves mesures que eviten aquestes confusions. When controlling for these confounds, we still find evidence across hundreds of languages that indeed there is a cross-linguistic tendency to front-load information in words.", 'cs': 'Psycholingvistické studie lidského zpracování textu a lexikálního přístupu poskytují dostatečné důkazy o preferované povaze slovo-initiálních versus slovo-finálních segmentů, např. z hlediska pozornosti věnované posluchači (větší) nebo pravděpodobnosti redukce ze strany řečníků (nižší). To vedlo k domněnce – jako ve Wedel et al. (2019b), ale běžné jinde – že jazyky se vyvinuly tak, aby poskytovaly více informací dříve ve slovech než později. Informačně-teoretické metody pro stanovení takových tendencí v lexikonech trpěly několika metodologickými nedostatky, které ponechávají otevřenou otázku, zda je tato vysoká slovo-počáteční informativita skutečně vlastností lexikonu nebo jen artefaktem inkrementální povahy rozpoznávání. V tomto článku poukazujeme na konfoundy v existujících metodách pro porovnání informativity segmentů na počátku slova s později ve slově a prezentujeme několik nových opatření, která se těmto konfoundům vyhnou. Při kontrole těchto změn stále nalezneme důkazy ve stovkách jazyků, že skutečně existuje mezijazyková tendence nahrávat informace ve slovech.', 'et': 'Inimese tekstitöötluse ja leksikaalse juurdepääsu psühhololingvistilised uuringud annavad piisavalt tõendeid sõna algsegmentide eelistatud olemusest võrreldes sõna lõppsegmentidega, näiteks kuulajate tähelepanu (suurem) või kõnelejate vähenemise tõenäosuse osas (väiksem). See on viinud eelduseni, nagu Wedel jt. (2019b), kuid levinud mujal, et keeled on arenenud rohkem sõnadega kui hiljem. Infoteoreetilised meetodid selliste tendentside tuvastamiseks leksikonides on kannatanud mitmete metodoloogiliste puuduste all, mis jätavad lahtiseks küsimuse, kas see kõrge sõna-esialgne informatiivsus on tegelikult leksikoni omadus või lihtsalt järjestikuse äratundmise artefakt. Käesolevas töös toome esile segadused olemasolevates meetodites võrreldes segmentide informatiivsust sõna varases ja hilisemas sõnas ning esitame mitmeid uusi meetmeid, mis neid segadusi vältivad. Nende segaduste kontrollimisel leiame ikka veel tõendeid sadade keelte kohta, et tõepoolest on olemas keeleülene kalduvus esitada teavet sõnades.', 'fi': 'Ihmisen tekstinkäsittelyä ja sanastoa koskevat psykolingvistiset tutkimukset antavat runsaasti näyttöä sanan alku- ja loppusegmenttien suosimasta luonteesta esimerkiksi kuuntelijoiden huomion suhteen (suurempi) tai puhujien vähenemisen todennäköisyyden suhteen (pienempi). Tämä on johtanut olettamukseen – kuten Wedel et al. (2019b), mutta yleinen muualla – että kielet ovat kehittyneet antamaan enemmän tietoa aikaisemmin sanoin kuin myöhemmin. Tietoteoreettiset menetelmät tällaisten suuntausten määrittämiseksi sanastoissa ovat kärsineet useista metodologisista puutteista, jotka jättävät avoimeksi kysymyksen siitä, onko tämä korkea sana-alkuinformatiivisuus todellisuudessa sanaston ominaisuus vai yksinkertaisesti tunnistuksen asteittaisen luonteen esine. Tässä artikkelissa osoitamme sekaannuksia olemassa olevissa menetelmissä vertailla segmenttien informatiivisuutta sanan varhaisessa vaiheessa ja myöhemmin, ja esittelemme useita uusia keinoja, joilla nämä sekaannukset vältetään. Kun kontrolloimme näitä sekaannuksia, löydämme edelleen satojen kielten kautta todisteita siitä, että kielienvälinen taipumus on lisätä tietoa sanoilla.', 'tr': 'Adamlar söz işleýäni we leksiýa ulaganyň Psikolingwistiki studiýalary söz-başlangyç we iň-soňky segmentleriň üstlenen tebigatynyň, meselâ diňleyicileriň (gowy) tarapyndan üns berilýäni ýa-da g ürleýçiler tarapyndan azaltmak mümkinçiligi (aşak). Bu, Wedel et al (2019-njy ýylda) tahmin edilmege mejbur boldy, ýöne başga yerlerde diller soňra sözleriň öňünden kän maglumat bermek üçin gelişmişdir. Leksikonlarda şeýle ýalany tanamak üçin maglumat-teoretik yöntemleri birnäçe metodolyk ýüzliklerden çykyp durýar. Bu ýokary söz-başlyk informatiýatlyk aslynda leksiýanyň häsiýeti ýa-da birnäçe tanamak tebigatynyň artefakty bolup çykýar. Bu kagyzda bolan zatlaryň informatiýatyny sözlerinde erkin we soňra sözlerinde kellämizi karşılaştyrmak üçin bar yönlerde çarpyşlyklary aýdýarys we bu çarpyşlyklardan çykarmak üçin birnäçe täze üýtgewleri çykýarys. Bu çagalar üçin gözleýände, biz entägem ýüzlerçe dillerden ybarat tapýarys çünki aslynda, sözler bilen öňünde bilgi yüklemek üçin çarpaz diller bar.', 'sk': 'Psiholingvistične študije človeške obdelave besedila in leksikalnega dostopa zagotavljajo veliko dokazov o prednostni naravi začetnega besedila v primerjavi s končnim besedilom, npr. v smislu pozornosti poslušalcev (večje) ali verjetnosti zmanjšanja govornikov (nižje). To je vodilo do domneve – kot v Wedel et al. (2019b), vendar običajne drugje – da so se jeziki razvili tako, da so zagotavljali več informacij prej kot kasneje. Informacijsko-teoretične metode za ugotavljanje takšnih teženj v leksikonih so utrpele številne metodološke pomanjkljivosti, ki puščajo odprto vprašanje, ali je ta visoka besedno-začetna informativnost dejansko lastnost leksikona ali preprosto artefakt stopnjevalne narave prepoznavanja. V prispevku opozarjamo na zmedenosti obstoječih metod za primerjavo informativnosti segmentov zgodaj v besedi in pozneje v besedi ter predstavljamo več novih ukrepov, ki se izognejo temu zmedenosti. Pri nadzoru teh zmedenosti še vedno najdemo dokaze v več sto jezikih, da obstaja medjezikovna težnja k prenašanju informacij v besedah.', 'jv': 'Iso perbudhakan kelas sing nggambar uwong in g nggambar adalah Iki lak wis kondho nggawe luwih-luwih kanggo Wedel et al (2011-b), kaya sak barêng langgar wih-wih dumadhi kanggo ngerwih informasi luwih apik dhéwé kaya vector. Awak-theoretik sing beraksi yang dipunangé sampek kanggo tinggal dipunangé luwih hayo nganggep sistem sing beraksi yang dipunangé awak dhéwé Awak dhéwé éntuk kuwi, awak dhéwé nggalakno karo hal-hal iki dadi supaya karo perbudhakan ingkang diolah Awak dhéwé nggawe nggalakno karo nganggo iki, awak dhéwé isih luwih akeh basa sing nyimpen karo ngono kuwi tindakan sing wis ana bantuan karo perusahaan langgar.', 'he': 'מחקרים פסיכולינגיסטיים על עיבוד מילים אנושיים וגישה לקסיקה מספקים ראיות רבות על הטבע המועדף של סגמנים מילים-קודמיים נגד מילים-סופיים, למשל, במונחים של תשומת לב שמשמעות על ידי הקשיבים (גדולה יותר) או הסיכוי להפחית על ידי דיבורים (נמוך יותר). זה הוביל לנחשה-כמו ב Wedel et al. (2019b), אבל משותפת במקום אחר שפות התפתחו כדי לספק יותר מידע מוקדם יותר במילים מאוחר יותר. שיטות מידע-תיאורטיות כדי לקבוע נוחות כאלה בלקסיקונים סבלו ממספר חסרות מטדולוגיות שמשאירות פתוחות את השאלה בעיתון הזה, אנו מצביעים על התבלבות בשיטות קיימות להשוות את המידע של חלקים מוקדם במילה ולאחר מכן במילה, ולהציג כמה צעדים חדשים שממנעים את התבלבות הללו. כשאנחנו שולטים על הבלבולות האלה, אנחנו עדיין מוצאים ראיות על ידי מאות שפות שבאמת יש נטייה לשפתיים לחצות מידע מוקדם במילים.', 'ha': "Tayyar aikin linguistic na canza maganar mutum da kuma ma'abũcin aikin leksisi yana da shaidar masu son zafi wa tsarin maganar-farko versa danne-ƙarshen kalma, misali, cikin muhalli da saurãre masu kiyaye (mafi girma) ko son ƙaranci da mazaɓa (ƙasƙanci). Tana sami zato da ke cikin Wide et al.(2019b), kuma amma waɗansu harshen dabam-dabam na dabam, sun tsãge su dõmin ya bãyar da lãbãri masu ƙaranci da aka ƙara. Shiryoyin-da-teoretic da za'a daidaita wannan tabar kwamfyuta cikin leksi sun yi cũtarwa daga wasu mataimaki masu yiwuwa wanda ke barin su buɗe tambayar ka ko kuma ma'anar wannan magana-farko na gaske ne ma'anar leksikon ko kuma yana da wata inuwantar gaskiyar masu sani na ƙaranci. Ga wannan takardan, Munã nuna musamman cikin metoden da ke jira dõmin ka sammeni masu labanci wa kwanan gaba ga kalma versa bayan da kalma, kuma Mu yanyanka wasu takwai masu sãbuwa da ke kange waɗannan. Idan za mu yi bincike wa wannan, sai za mu sãmi shaidar a kan ɗari na harshen cẽwa lalle ne, akwai wani irin mutane da ke samu-lodi da takardar magana.", 'bo': 'Psycholinguistic studies of human word processing and lexical access provide ample evidence of the preferred nature of word-initial versus word-final segments, e.g. in terms of attention paid by listeners (greater) or the likelihood of reduction by speakers (lower). འདིས་Wedel et al (2019b)ནང་གི་མ་དངུལ་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་དང་འགྱུར་བར་ཆགས་བྱུང་། གནད་དོན་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ལམ་ལུགས་གཙོ་རིམ་སྟོན་པར་ཨིན་ན། འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་སྔོན་ཡོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ནང་གི་མདུན་ཚོད་དག་གི་དོན་དག་གི་རྣམ་གྲངས་སྔོན་གྱི་ཐ་སྙད་དང་དུས་ཚོད་ལྟར གནད་དོན་འགྱུར་བ་འདི་དག་ལ་ཚད་འཛིན་སྐབས་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་མཐོང་ཐུབ་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་སྔོན་ལྟ་ཀློ'}
{'en': 'If you’ve got it, flaunt it : Making the most of fine-grained sentiment annotations', 'es': 'Si lo tiene, haga alarde de ello: aproveche al máximo las anotaciones de opinión detalladas', 'fr': "Si vous l'avez, faites-en étalage\xa0: Tirez le meilleur parti des annotations d'opinion à grain fin", 'ar': 'إذا كنت قد حصلت عليه ، تفاخر به: حقق أقصى استفادة من التعليقات التوضيحية الدقيقة للمشاعر', 'pt': 'Se você tem, ostente-o: aproveitando ao máximo as anotações de sentimento refinadas', 'ja': '持っているなら自慢しましょう：細かい感情の注釈を最大限に活用しましょう', 'zh': '若已得之,请炫耀之,以尽细粒度之情', 'hi': 'यदि आपके पास यह है, तो इसे दिखाएं: ठीक-ठाक भावना एनोटेशन का सबसे अधिक बनाना', 'ru': 'Если он у вас есть, продемонстрируйте его: делая максимум из мелкозернистых аннотаций настроений', 'ga': 'M찼 t찼 s챕 agat, bog 챕: Bain leas as n처ta챠 meon m챠nghlanta', 'hu': 'Ha megvan, mutasd meg: A legtöbbet hozd ki a finom szemcsés hangulatjegyzetekből', 'ka': 'თუ თქვენ მივიღეთ, გადაწყენეთ: გავაკეთოთ უფრო ნაკლები სენტიმენტის ანოტაციები', 'el': 'Αν το έχετε, δείξτε το: Αξιοποιώντας στο έπακρο τις λεπτόκοκκες σημειώσεις συναισθημάτων', 'lt': 'Jei jūs turite tai, sugalvokite: kuo geriau panaudoti smulkių jausmų anotacijas', 'it': "Se ce l'hai, ostentati: Sfruttando al massimo le annotazioni di sentiment a grana fine", 'kk': 'Егер ол бар болса, оны жалғастырыңыз:', 'mk': 'Ако го имате, размислете: да ги искористите најдобрите анатации на сентиментите', 'ms': 'Jika anda mendapatkannya, flaunt ia: membuat yang terbaik annotasi sentimen yang baik-bijian', 'ml': 'നിങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് കിട്ടിയാല്\u200d അത് വെറുതെ തോന്നുക:', 'mt': 'Jekk inti għandek dan, flaunt it: Tiġi sfruttata l-aktar mill-annotazzjonijiet tas-sentiment imħabbar fin', 'pl': 'Jeśli to masz, pochwal się: maksymalne wykorzystanie drobnoziarnistych adnotacji sentymentów', 'ro': 'Dacă îl aveți, arătați-l: Profitați la maxim de adnotările de sentimente fine', 'mn': 'Хэрвээ та үүнийг авсан бол, үүнийг сайхан мэдрэмжтэй ихэнх сэтгэл хөдлөл хийх нь', 'sr': 'Ako je imaš, ispravi to: napraviti najlepše uznemiravanje osjećaja.', 'si': 'ඔයාට ඒක තියෙනවා නම්, ඒක ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න: හොඳ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් කරන්න.', 'no': 'Dersom du har fått det, fjern det frå: Lagar dei mest fyrste sentiment- notasjonane', 'so': 'Haddii aad haysato, iska bixi: ka sameynta dhibaatooyinka ugu wacan', 'ta': 'நீங்கள் கிடைத்தால், அதை வெளியேற்றுங்கள்: மிகவும் நல்ல பிடிக்கப்பட்ட உணர்வு குறிப்புகளை செய்கிறது', 'sv': 'Om du har den, visa upp den: Få ut det mesta av finkorniga sentimentkommentarer', 'ur': 'اگر آپ کو ملے تو اسے چمکتے رہیں: بہترین انگور کے احساسات بناتے ہیں', 'uz': "Agar sizga ega bo'lsa, buni ajoyib qiling: eng yaxshi g'oyalar hisoblanishini", 'vi': 'Nếu bạn có nó, hãy phô trương nó: tận dụng tối đa các chú thích cảm xúc.', 'bg': 'Ако го имате, покажете го: Възползвайте се максимално от фините сантиментални анотации', 'hr': 'Ako ga imate, ispunite ga: napraviti najbolje uznemiravanje osjećaja.', 'da': 'Hvis du har det, kan du fremhæve det: Få mest muligt ud af finkornede følelsesmærkninger', 'nl': 'Als je het hebt, laat het dan zien: het beste maken van fijne sentimentannotaties', 'de': 'Wenn Sie es haben, zeigen Sie es: Machen Sie das Beste aus feinkörnigen Sentiment-Anmerkungen', 'fa': 'اگر آن را دارید، آن را تغییر دهید: بسیاری از احساسات خوشمزه\u200cای انجام دهید', 'ko': '만일 네가 그것을 가지고 있다면 그것을 자랑해라: 섬세한 입도의 감정 주석을 충분히 이용하라', 'id': 'Jika Anda mendapatkannya, berlebihan: membuat paling banyak anotasi sentimen yang baik', 'sw': "If you've got it, flaunt it: Making the most of fine-grained sentiment annotations", 'tr': 'Eğer elinizde olsa da hissetmelisiniz:duygularının en büyük şekilde oluşturmak,', 'af': 'As jy dit het, maak dit: maak die mees van fyn-koring sentimente annotasies', 'sq': 'Nëse e keni atë, flaunt atë: duke bërë më të mirën e anotacioneve të ndjenjave të holla', 'am': 'ካገኘህ፣ አስታውቀው፤ የመልካም አስተያየት ማሰናከል ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Եթե դուք հասկանում եք, ապա պատկերացրեք. լավագույնը օգտագործելով նրբագեղ զգացմունքների նկարագրությունները', 'bn': 'যদি আপনি পেয়েছেন, তাহলে ফ্ল্যান্ড করুন: সবচেয়ে ভালো আচরণের বিরক্তিকর মনে হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Ako je imaš, ispravi to: napraviti najlepše uznemiravanje osjećaja.', 'az': '∆Źg…ôr …ôlinizd…ô olsa, onu f…ôrql…ôyin: …ôn yaxŇüńĪ hissl…ôr yaratmaq', 'ca': 'Si ho teniu, flaunt-ho: Fent el màxim de les anotacions de sentiments fines', 'cs': 'Pokud ji máte, chlubte se tím: Využití jemně zrnitých anotací sentimentů', 'et': 'Kui teil on see olemas, näidake seda: peenete sentimentaalsete märkuste maksimaalne ärakasutamine', 'fi': 'Jos sinulla on se, esittele sitä: hienorakeisten tunteilmoitusten hyödyntäminen parhaalla mahdollisella tavalla', 'jv': 'Sing iso ngomong, njuk ijol-ijol: iso nggawe dolanan luwih apik ngomong.', 'ha': 'Idan ana sami shi, ka sami shi: Ka sami mafi kyaun kashfa mai kyau', 'sk': 'Če ga imate, ga pokažite: kar najbolje izkoristite drobnozrnate opombe občutkov', 'he': 'אם יש לך את זה, תזמין את זה: להפוך את הכי הרבה ציונים של רגשות נפלאים', 'bo': 'གལ་སྲིད་ན་ཁྱེད་ཚོར་ཡོད་ན། འོད་ཀྱང་། སེམས་ཅན་གྱི་ཚོར་བ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་སྣང་བ་བཟོ་བཅུག་གི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Fine-grained sentiment analysis attempts to extract sentiment holders, targets and polar expressions and resolve the relationship between them, but progress has been hampered by the difficulty of annotation. Targeted sentiment analysis, on the other hand, is a more narrow task, focusing on extracting sentiment targets and classifying their polarity. In this paper, we explore whether incorporating holder and expression information can improve target extraction and classification and perform experiments on eight English datasets. We conclude that jointly predicting target and polarity BIO labels improves target extraction, and that augmenting the input text with gold expressions generally improves targeted polarity classification. This highlights the potential importance of annotating expressions for fine-grained sentiment datasets. At the same time, our results show that performance of current models for predicting polar expressions is poor, hampering the benefit of this information in practice.', 'ar': 'يحاول تحليل المشاعر الدقيق استخلاص أصحاب المشاعر والأهداف والتعبيرات القطبية وحل العلاقة بينهم ، لكن التقدم تعرقل بسبب صعوبة التعليقات التوضيحية. من ناحية أخرى ، يعد تحليل المشاعر المستهدفة مهمة أكثر تحديدًا ، حيث تركز على استخراج أهداف المشاعر وتصنيف قطبيتها. في هذه الورقة ، نستكشف ما إذا كان دمج معلومات الحامل والتعبير يمكن أن يحسن الاستخراج والتصنيف المستهدفين وإجراء تجارب على ثماني مجموعات بيانات إنجليزية. نستنتج أن التنبؤ المشترك بعلامات BIO المستهدفة والقطبية يعمل على تحسين الاستخراج المستهدف ، وأن زيادة نص الإدخال بتعبيرات ذهبية يؤدي بشكل عام إلى تحسين تصنيف القطبية المستهدفة. يسلط هذا الضوء على الأهمية المحتملة للتعليقات التوضيحية لمجموعات بيانات المشاعر الدقيقة. في الوقت نفسه ، تُظهر نتائجنا أن أداء النماذج الحالية للتنبؤ بالتعبيرات القطبية ضعيف ، مما يعيق الاستفادة من هذه المعلومات في الممارسة العملية.', 'fr': "L'analyse fine des sentiments tente d'extraire les détenteurs de sentiment, les cibles et les expressions polaires et de résoudre la relation entre eux, mais les progrès ont été entravés par la difficulté de l'annotation. L'analyse ciblée des sentiments, quant à elle, est une tâche plus restreinte, qui se concentre sur l'extraction des cibles de sentiment et la classification de leur polarité. Dans cet article, nous explorons si l'intégration des informations de support et d'expression peut améliorer l'extraction et la classification des cibles et effectuer des expériences sur huit ensembles de données anglais. Nous concluons que la prédiction conjointe des étiquettes BIO de cible et de polarité améliore l'extraction de la cible, et que l'augmentation du texte d'entrée avec des expressions dorées améliore généralement la classification de polarité ciblée. Cela met en évidence l'importance potentielle d'annoter des expressions pour des ensembles de données de sentiments précis. Dans le même temps, nos résultats montrent que les performances des modèles actuels de prédiction des expressions polaires sont médiocres, ce qui nuit au bénéfice de ces informations dans la pratique.", 'ja': '細かい感情分析は、感情ホルダー、ターゲット、および極性表現を抽出し、それらの間の関係を解決しようと試みますが、注釈の難しさによって進展が妨げられています。 一方、ターゲットを絞った感情分析は、感情ターゲットの抽出とその極性の分類に焦点を当てた、より狭いタスクです。 本稿では，ホルダーと発現情報を組み込むことで標的の抽出と分類を改善できるかどうかを検討し， 8つの英語データセットについて実験を行う． 標的バイオラベルと極性バイオラベルを共同で予測することで標的抽出が改善され、金の発現で入力テキストを増強することで標的極性分類が一般的に改善されると結論づけている。 これは、細かい感情データセットに注釈を付ける表現の潜在的な重要性を強調しています。 同時に、極性表現を予測するための現在のモデルのパフォーマンスが悪く、実際にはこの情報の利点を妨げていることを示しています。', 'pt': 'A análise de sentimento refinada tenta extrair detentores de sentimento, alvos e expressões polares e resolver a relação entre eles, mas o progresso foi prejudicado pela dificuldade de anotação. A análise de sentimento direcionada, por outro lado, é uma tarefa mais restrita, focando na extração de alvos de sentimento e na classificação de sua polaridade. Neste artigo, exploramos se a incorporação de informações de titular e expressão pode melhorar a extração e classificação de alvos e realizar experimentos em oito conjuntos de dados em inglês. Concluímos que a previsão conjunta de rótulos BIO de alvo e polaridade melhora a extração de alvo e que aumentar o texto de entrada com expressões de ouro geralmente melhora a classificação de polaridade direcionada. Isso destaca a importância potencial de anotar expressões para conjuntos de dados de sentimento refinados. Ao mesmo tempo, nossos resultados mostram que o desempenho dos modelos atuais para prever expressões polares é ruim, dificultando o benefício dessas informações na prática.', 'hi': 'ठीक-ठाक भावना विश्लेषण भावना धारकों, लक्ष्यों और ध्रुवीय अभिव्यक्तियों को निकालने और उनके बीच के संबंधों को हल करने का प्रयास करता है, लेकिन प्रगति एनोटेशन की कठिनाई से बाधित हुई है। दूसरी ओर, लक्षित भावना विश्लेषण, एक अधिक संकीर्ण कार्य है, जो भावना लक्ष्यों को निकालने और उनकी ध्रुवीयता को वर्गीकृत करने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करता है। इस पेपर में, हम यह पता लगाते हैं कि क्या धारक और अभिव्यक्ति की जानकारी को शामिल करने से लक्ष्य निष्कर्षण और वर्गीकरण में सुधार हो सकता है और आठ अंग्रेजी डेटासेट पर प्रयोग किए जा सकते हैं। हम निष्कर्ष निकालते हैं कि संयुक्त रूप से लक्ष्य और ध्रुवीयता BIO लेबल की भविष्यवाणी करने से लक्ष्य निष्कर्षण में सुधार होता है, और सोने की अभिव्यक्तियों के साथ इनपुट टेक्स्ट को बढ़ाने से आमतौर पर लक्षित ध्रुवीयता वर्गीकरण में सुधार होता है। यह ठीक दानेदार भावना डेटासेट के लिए अभिव्यक्तियों को एनोटेट करने के संभावित महत्व पर प्रकाश डालता है। उसी समय, हमारे परिणाम बताते हैं कि ध्रुवीय अभिव्यक्तियों की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए वर्तमान मॉडल का प्रदर्शन खराब है, जो व्यवहार में इस जानकारी के लाभ को बाधित करता है।', 'es': 'El análisis detallado de los sentimientos intenta extraer los titulares de sentimientos, los objetivos y las expresiones polares y resolver la relación entre ellos, pero el progreso se ha visto obstaculizado por la dificultad de la anotación. El análisis de sentimiento dirigido, por otro lado, es una tarea más limitada, que se centra en extraer objetivos de sentimiento y clasificar su polaridad. En este artículo, exploramos si la incorporación de información sobre soportes y expresiones puede mejorar la extracción y clasificación de objetivos y realizar experimentos en ocho conjuntos de datos en inglés. Concluimos que la predicción conjunta de las etiquetas BIO del objetivo y la polaridad mejora la extracción del objetivo, y que el aumento del texto de entrada con expresiones de oro generalmente mejora la clasificación de la polaridad objetivo. Esto resalta la importancia potencial de anotar expresiones para conjuntos de datos de opinión detallados. Al mismo tiempo, nuestros resultados muestran que el rendimiento de los modelos actuales para predecir las expresiones polares es deficiente, lo que dificulta el beneficio de esta información en la práctica.', 'ru': 'Анализ мелкозернистых настроений пытается извлечь обладателей настроений, цели и полярные выражения и разрешить отношения между ними, но прогрессу мешает трудность аннотации. С другой стороны, целевой анализ настроений - это более узкая задача, ориентированная на извлечение целей настроений и классификацию их полярности. В этой статье мы исследуем, может ли включение информации о владельцах и экспрессии улучшить извлечение и классификацию мишени и провести эксперименты на восьми английских наборах данных. Мы делаем вывод, что совместное прогнозирование меток мишени и полярности улучшает извлечение мишени, и что дополнение входного текста выражениями золота, как правило, улучшает классификацию полярности мишени. Это подчеркивает потенциальную важность аннотирования выражений для мелкозернистых наборов данных настроек. В то же время, наши результаты показывают, что производительность текущих моделей прогнозирования полярных выражений низкая, что препятствует использованию этой информации на практике.', 'zh': '细粒度之情析持有者、趋、极性以达之,而进退阻碍于注难。 其一,针对性情析为狭务,侧重于取其情而分其极性。 本文讨论持有人与否改善靶标提取分类,并于八英文数集上实验之。 臣等所论,合占极性BIO标可以改善,且以金表达式增输文本常改善极性类。 此凸显为细粒度情数集注表达式之重要也。 同时之果表明,极性形差劣,阻其在实践中益。', 'ga': 'Déanann anailís mhionsonraithe dhearcadh iarracht sealbhóirí meon, spriocanna agus nathanna polacha a bhaint as agus an gaol eatarthu a réiteach, ach tá an dul chun cinn curtha isteach ag deacracht na nótála. Ar an láimh eile, is tasc níos cúinge é anailís dhearcadh spriocdhírithe, ag díriú ar spriocanna meon a bhaint amach agus a bpolúlacht a rangú. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid iniúchadh ar cé acu an féidir feabhas a chur ar eastóscadh agus rangú sprice trí fhaisnéis faoi shealbhóirí agus slonn a ionchorprú agus déanfaimid turgnaimh ar ocht tacar sonraí Béarla. Bainimid de thátal as go bhfeabhsaítear eastóscadh sprice má dhéantar comhthuar ar lipéid sprioc-agus-polarúlachta BIO, agus go bhfeabhsaítear an t-aicmiú spriocdhírithe polaraíochta de ghnáth trí an téacs ionchuir a mhéadú le habairtí óir. Leagann sé seo béim ar an tábhacht a d’fhéadfadh a bheith le habairtí a anótáil le haghaidh tacair sonraí meon mínghlanta. Ag an am céanna, léiríonn ár dtorthaí go bhfuil feidhmíocht na múnlaí reatha chun abairtí polacha a thuar go dona, rud a chuireann bac ar leas na faisnéise seo go praiticiúil.', 'ka': 'სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციის ძალიან ძალიან გამოყენება სენტიმენტის მართლას, მიზეზების და polური გამოსახულების გამოსახულება და განსახულება შესახებ მათგანი შორის, მაგრამ პროგრესი ამოცანების რთულია უფრო ცნობიერი სენტიმენტის ანალიზაცია, მეორე მხარეს, უფრო ცნობიერი რაოდენობა, რომელიც სენტიმენტის მიზეზების ექსტრექტირება და სენტიმენტის პოლარიტის კ ამ დოკუნეში, ჩვენ განსხვავებთ თუ არა შეიყვანეთ ინფორმაცია არსებელი და გამოსახულებელი ინფორმაციის შესაძლებელია უფრო მეტი ექქსპექცია და კლასიფიკაცია და ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ, რომ საერთოდ მიზეზი და პოლარიტები BIO-ს ლაბეტები უფრო მეტადებს მიზეზი ექსტრექციას, და რომ დავაწყებული ტექსტის მეტადება, რომელიც უფრო მეტადება მიზე ეს აღწერს შესაძლებელი მნიშვნელობა, რომელიც აღწერების გამოსახულების გამოსახულების შესაძლებელობა. ერთადერთი დროში, ჩვენი წარმოდგენები აჩვენებენ, რომ მიმდინარე მოდელების გამოსახულება პოლარის გამოსახულებებისთვის ცოტა, რომელიც ამ ინფორმაციის გამოსახულებას პრაქ', 'it': "L'analisi del sentiment a grana fine tenta di estrarre detentori di sentiment, target ed espressioni polari e risolvere la relazione tra di loro, ma il progresso è stato ostacolato dalla difficoltà di annotazione. L'analisi mirata del sentiment, d'altra parte, è un compito più ristretto, concentrandosi sull'estrazione di target sentiment e classificare la loro polarità. In questo articolo, esaminiamo se incorporare informazioni sul titolare e sull'espressione può migliorare l'estrazione e la classificazione del target ed eseguire esperimenti su otto set di dati inglesi. Concludiamo che predire congiuntamente le etichette BIO target e polarità migliora l'estrazione del target, e che l'aumento del testo in ingresso con espressioni dorate migliora generalmente la classificazione mirata della polarità. Ciò evidenzia la potenziale importanza di annotare espressioni per set di dati di sentiment a grana fine. Allo stesso tempo, i nostri risultati mostrano che le prestazioni degli attuali modelli di previsione delle espressioni polari sono scarse, ostacolando il beneficio di queste informazioni nella pratica.", 'hu': 'A finomszemcsés érzelmek elemzése megpróbálja kivonni az érzelmek tulajdonosait, célpontjait és poláris kifejezéseket, és megoldani a köztük lévő kapcsolatot, de a fejlődést akadályozta a jegyzetek nehézsége. A célzott érzelmek elemzése viszont szűkebb feladat, amely az érzelmi célok kivonására és polaritásuk osztályozására összpontosít. Ebben a tanulmányban azt vizsgáljuk, hogy a tulajdonos- és kifejezési információk beépítése javíthatja-e a célkitűzést és osztályozást, és kísérleteket végezhet nyolc angol adathalmazon. Arra a következtetésre jutunk, hogy a cél és polaritás BIO címkék közös előrejelzése javítja a cél kivonását, és hogy a bemeneti szöveg arany kifejezésekkel történő bővítése általában javítja a célzott polaritás osztályozását. Ez rávilágít a kifejezések jegyzetelésének lehetséges fontosságára a finom szemű hangulatadatok esetében. Ugyanakkor eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy a poláris kifejezések előrejelzésére szolgáló jelenlegi modellek teljesítménye gyenge, ami akadályozza ezen információk hasznát a gyakorlatban.', 'kk': 'Сөздіктерді, мақсатты және полярдық өрнектерді тарқату және олардың арасындағы қатынасын шешу әрекетін шешу әрекеттері, бірақ жағдайды жаңарту көпшілігіне шешілді. Біріншіден мақсатты сезімдерді анализ - көпшілік тапсырмасы, сезімдер мақсаттарын тарқату және олардың поляриялығын классификациялауға көздейтін. Бұл қағазда, сақтаушылар мен өрнегінің мәліметін қосып, мақсатты тарқату мен классификациясын жақсартып, сегіз ағылшын деректер қорларында тәжірибелер жасауға болады. Біз бірге мақсатты және поляриттік BIO жарлықтарын біріктіру үшін мақсатты тарқатуды жақсы көрсетеді, және алтын өрнектерінен енгізу мәтіні көтеру үшін көбірек мақсатты поляриттік клас Бұл көмектесу деректер қорларының өрнектерін белгілеу мүмкіндігін белгілеп береді. Біздің нәтижелеріміз сол уақытта, полярдық өрнектерді таңдау үшін назардағы үлгілердің істеу керектігін көрсетеді, бұл мәліметтің пайдасын әрекетінде көмектеседі.', 'lt': 'Fine-grained sentiment analysis attempts to extract sentiment holders, targets and polar expressions and resolve the relationship between them, but progress has been hampered by the difficulty of annotation.  Kita vertus, tikslinė jausmų analizė yra siauresnė užduotis, kurioje daugiausia dėmesio skiriama jausmų tikslų gavimui ir jų poliarumui klasifikuoti. Šiame dokumente mes tiriame, ar įtraukiant turėtojo ir išraiškos informaciją galima pagerinti tikslinį gavimą ir klasifikavimą bei atlikti eksperimentus su aštuoniais anglų duomenų rinkiniais. Mes darome išvadą, kad bendrai nuspėjant tikslinius ir poliarinius BIO ženklus pagerėja tikslinis ekstrahavimas ir kad padidinant įvestą tekstą aukso išraiškomis paprastai pagerėja tikslinis poliarinis klasifikavimas. Tai pabrėžia galimą nuorodų reikšmę smulkiai apdorotų jautrumo duomenų rinkiniams. Tuo pat metu mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad dabartinių modelių, skirtų polinėms išraiškoms prognozuoti, rezultatai yra prasti, todėl praktiškai ši informacija gali būti naudinga.', 'mk': 'Обиди за анализа на сентиментите со фино жито за извлекување на чувствата, мети и поларни изрази и решавање на односот помеѓу нив, но напредокот е попречен од тешкотијата на анотацијата. Целна анализа на чувствата, од друга страна, е потесна задача, фокусирана на извлекување на цели на чувствата и класификување на нивната поларитет. In this paper, we explore whether incorporating holder and expression information can improve target extraction and classification and perform experiments on eight English datasets.  Завршуваме дека заедничкото предвидување на метата и поларитетот на етикетите БИО ја подобрува извлекувањето на метата, и дека зголемувањето на вводниот текст со златни изрази генерално ја подобрува целната класификација на поларитетот. Ова ја истакнува потенцијалната важност на анатирање на изразите за фино растени сентиментални податоци. Истовремено, нашите резултати покажуваат дека резултатите на актуелните модели за предвидување на поларните изрази се лоши, што ја попречува користта од оваа информација во практиката.', 'mt': 'Analiżi tas-sentimenti bi ħbub fin tipprova testrezzjona d-detenturi tas-sentimenti, il-miri u l-espressjonijiet polari u tirriżolvi r-relazzjoni bejniethom, iżda l-progress kien imfixkel mid-diffikultà tal-annotazzjoni. Min-naħa l-oħra, l-analiżi tas-sentimenti mmirata hija kompitu aktar strett, li tiffoka fuq l-estrazzjoni tal-miri tas-sentimenti u l-klassifikazzjoni tal-polarità tagħhom. F’dan id-dokument, nistudjaw jekk l-inkorporazzjoni ta’ informazzjoni dwar id-detentur u l-espressjoni tistax ittejjeb l-estrazzjoni u l-klassifikazzjoni fil-mira u twettaq esperimenti fuq tmien settijiet ta’ dejta Ingliżi. Aħna kkonkludew li t-tbassir konġunt tat-tikketti tal-mira u tal-polarità tal-BIO jtejjeb l-estrazzjoni tal-mira, u li ż-żieda fit-test tal-input b’espressjonijiet tad-deheb ġeneralment ittejjeb il-klassifikazzjoni tal-polarità mmirata. Dan jenfasizza l-importanza potenzjali ta’ espressjonijiet ta’ annotazzjoni għal settijiet ta’ dejta tas-sentimenti b’għamla fina. Fl-istess ħin, ir-riżultati tagħna juru li l-prestazzjoni tal-mudelli attwali għat-tbassir tal-espressjonijiet polari hija fqira, u dan ifixkel il-benefiċċju ta’ din l-informazzjoni fil-prattika.', 'ml': 'സുഖമായ വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d, ലക്ഷ്യങ്ങള്\u200d, പോളര്\u200d പ്രസ്താനങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്ന ശ്രമം, അവയ്ക്കിടയിലുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d തീരുമാനിക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക ആഗ്രഹിക്കപ്പെട്ട അനുഭവങ്ങള്\u200d മറ്റുവശത്ത് കൂടുതല്\u200d ചെറുതായ ഒരു ജോലിയാണ്, വികാരണത്തിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യങ്ങളെ പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിനെയ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു, കൈക്കൊള്ളുന്നവനും പ്രസ്താവിക വിവരങ്ങളും ലക്ഷ്യം പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതും ക്ലാസ്ഫിക് നമ്മള്\u200d അവസാനിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്റെയും അശുദ്ധീകരണത്തിന്റെയും ബിഐഒ ലേബുകളുടെയും ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്റെ പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിനെയും കൂടുതല നല്ല കൈക്കൊള്ളുന്ന അനുഭവങ്ങളുടെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200dക്ക് വ്യക്തമായ പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രധ അതേ സമയത്ത്, നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ മോഡലുകളുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനം പ്രവചിക്കുന്നത് പോളിര്\u200d പ്ര', 'ms': 'Analisis perasaan berwarna gandum cuba untuk mengekstrak pemegang perasaan, sasaran dan ungkapan kutub dan menyelesaikan hubungan antara mereka, tetapi kemajuan telah diganggu oleh kesukaran annotasi. Analisis perasaan sasaran, pada sisi lain, adalah tugas yang lebih sempit, fokus pada mengekstrak sasaran perasaan dan mengklasifikasi polariti mereka. Dalam kertas ini, kita mengeksplorasi sama ada memasukkan maklumat pemegang dan ungkapan boleh meningkatkan ekstraksi sasaran dan klasifikasi dan melakukan eksperimen pada lapan set data Inggeris. Kami menyimpulkan bahawa bersama-sama meramalkan target dan polariti label BIO meningkatkan ekstraksi sasaran, dan bahawa menambah teks input dengan ungkapan emas biasanya meningkatkan klasifikasi polariti sasaran. Ini menyatakan kepentingan potensi bagi ungkapan anotasi bagi set data sentimen yang bersinar-baik. Pada masa yang sama, hasil kita menunjukkan bahawa prestasi model semasa untuk meramalkan ungkapan kutub adalah buruk, menghalang keuntungan maklumat ini dalam praktek.', 'el': 'Η λεπτή ανάλυση συναισθημάτων επιχειρεί να εξαγάγει τους κατόχους συναισθημάτων, τους στόχους και τις πολικές εκφράσεις και να επιλύσει τη σχέση μεταξύ τους, αλλά η πρόοδος έχει παρεμποδιστεί από τη δυσκολία της σχολιασμού. Η στοχευμένη ανάλυση συναισθημάτων, από την άλλη πλευρά, είναι ένα πιο στενό έργο, εστιάζοντας στην εξαγωγή των στόχων συναισθημάτων και στην ταξινόμηση της πολικότητας τους. Σε αυτή την εργασία, διερευνούμε αν η ενσωμάτωση πληροφοριών κατόχου και έκφρασης μπορεί να βελτιώσει την εξαγωγή και ταξινόμηση στόχων και να εκτελέσει πειράματα σε οκτώ αγγλικά σύνολα δεδομένων. Συμπεραίνουμε ότι η κοινή πρόβλεψη των ετικετών στόχου και πολικότητας βελτιώνει την εξαγωγή στόχων και ότι η αύξηση του κειμένου εισαγωγής με χρυσές εκφράσεις γενικά βελτιώνει την στοχευμένη ταξινόμηση πολικότητας. Αυτό υπογραμμίζει τη δυνητική σημασία της σχολιασμού εκφράσεων για λεπτόκοκκα σύνολα δεδομένων συναισθημάτων. Ταυτόχρονα, τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ότι οι επιδόσεις των σημερινών μοντέλων για την πρόβλεψη πολικών εκφράσεων είναι φτωχές, εμποδίζοντας το όφελος αυτών των πληροφοριών στην πράξη.', 'pl': 'Drobnoziarnista analiza sentymentów próbuje wyodrębnić posiadacze sentymentów, cele i wyrażenia polarne i rozwiązać relację między nimi, ale postęp utrudniał trudność z adnotacją. Z drugiej strony ukierunkowana analiza sentymentów jest bardziej wąskim zadaniem, skupiającym się na wydobyciu celów sentymentów i klasyfikacji ich polaryzacji. W niniejszym artykule badamy, czy włączenie informacji o posiadaczu i ekspresji może poprawić ekstrakcję i klasyfikację docelową oraz przeprowadzamy eksperymenty na ośmiu angielskich zbiorach danych. Wnioskujemy, że wspólne przewidywanie etykiet BIO docelowych i polaryzacyjnych poprawia ekstrakcję docelową, a rozszerzenie tekstu wejściowego o złote wyrażenia ogólnie poprawia ukierunkowaną klasyfikację polaryzacji. Podkreśla to potencjalne znaczenie adnotacji wyrażeń dla precyzyjnych zbiorów danych sentymentów. Jednocześnie nasze wyniki pokazują, że wydajność obecnych modeli przewidywania wyrażeń polarnych jest słaba, utrudniając korzyści z tych informacji w praktyce.', 'ro': 'Analiza fină a sentimentelor încearcă să extragă deținătorii de sentimente, țintele și expresiile polare și să rezolve relația dintre ele, dar progresul a fost împiedicat de dificultatea adnotării. Analiza țintită a sentimentelor, pe de altă parte, este o sarcină mai îngustă, concentrându-se pe extragerea țintelor sentimentale și clasificarea polarității acestora. În această lucrare, explorăm dacă încorporarea informațiilor despre titular și expresie poate îmbunătăți extragerea și clasificarea țintelor și efectuarea de experimente pe opt seturi de date în limba engleză. Concluzionăm că predicția comună a etichetelor BIO țintă și polaritate îmbunătățește extragerea țintei și că mărirea textului de intrare cu expresii aurii îmbunătățește în general clasificarea polarității țintite. Acest lucru evidențiază importanța potențială a adnotării expresiilor pentru seturile de date cu granule fine ale sentimentelor. În același timp, rezultatele noastre arată că performanța modelelor actuale de predicție a expresiilor polare este slabă, ceea ce împiedică beneficiul acestor informații în practică.', 'sr': 'Analiza finog zrnca sentimenta pokušava da izvuče države sentimenta, ciljeve i polarne izraze i reši odnos između njih, ali napredak je ometao teškoća annotacije. Ciljna analiza sentiment a, sa druge strane, je suža zadatak, fokusirana je na izvlačenje ciljeva sentimenta i klasifikaciju njihove polarnosti. U ovom papiru istražujemo da li uključujući informacije o državama i izrazu mogu poboljšati izvlačenje i klasifikaciju ciljeva i izvršiti eksperimente na osam engleskih podataka. Zaključili smo da zajednički predviđanje meta i polarnosti oznake BIO poboljšava izvlačenje meta i da povećanje teksta ulaska sa zlatnim izrazom obično poboljšava ciljnu klasifikaciju polarnosti. To ukazuje na potencijalnu važnost annotacije izraza za kompletne sentimentalne podatke. U isto vreme, naši rezultati pokazuju da je provedba trenutnih modela za predviđanje polarnih izraza siromašna, ometanje koristi ove informacije na praksi.', 'so': "Analyska fikrada si fiican loo qabsado wuxuu isku dayaa in uu soo bixiyo qofka dareemada leh, alaabta iyo muuqashada polar ah, wuxuuna go’aan u baahan yahay xiriirka dhexdooda, laakiin horumarinta ayaa dhibaatada dhibaatada ku jirta. Fiirinta dareemaha la xiriiray waa shaqo fudud oo aad u fiirsan karto in la soo bixiyo waxyaabaha dareenka ah iyo in loo kala soocayyo polarinimadooda. In this paper, we explore whether incorporating holder and expression information can improve target extraction and classification and perform experiments on eight English datasets.  Waxaynu ku dhamaynaynaa in si wada jir ah looga sii sheegayo alaabta waxqabadka iyo baaritaanka BIO uu kordhiyo soo saarashada goalka, iyo in lagu kordhiyo qoraalka laga soo qoro oo uu ku qoro hadal dahab ah, sida caadiga ah wuxuu kordhiyaa fasalka polarinta la hagaajiyey. Tani waxay ka muuqataa muhiimka suurtagalka ah oo ay ku cadaadiyaan hadal ku saabsan macluumaadka dareemaha. isla waqtigaas waxaa la muujiyaa resultiyadeena in sameynta qaababka soo socda ee la sii sheegayo hadalka polar waa miskiin, wuxuuna dhibaataysaa faa'iidada macluumaadkan sida caadiga ah.", 'sv': 'Finkornig sentimentalanalys försöker utvinna sentimenthållare, mål och polära uttryck och lösa relationen mellan dem, men framsteg har hindrats av svårigheten att kommentera. Målinriktad sentimentalanalys, å andra sidan, är en mer smal uppgift, med fokus på att extrahera sentimentalmål och klassificera deras polaritet. I denna uppsats undersöker vi om inkorporering av innehavare- och uttrycksinformation kan förbättra målutvinning och klassificering samt utför experiment på åtta engelska dataset. Vi drar slutsatsen att gemensamt förutsäga mål- och polaritetsBIO-etiketter förbättrar målutvinningen, och att utöka inmatningstexten med gulduttryck generellt förbättrar riktad polaritetsklassificering. Detta belyser den potentiella betydelsen av att kommentera uttryck för finkorniga sentimentdataset. Samtidigt visar våra resultat att prestandan hos nuvarande modeller för att förutsäga polära uttryck är dålig, vilket hämmar nyttan av denna information i praktiken.', 'ta': 'சரியான பிடிக்கப்பட்ட உணர்வு ஆராய்வு, உணர்வு பிடிப்பவர்கள், இலக்குகள் மற்றும் தூர கூற்றுகளை வெளியேற்ற முயற்சி மற்றும் அவைகளுக்கிடையே உள்ள தொடர் எதிர்பார்க்கப்பட்ட உணர்வு ஆய்வு, மற்றொரு பக்கத்தில், அது ஒரு சிறிய செயல், உணர்வு இலக்குகளை வெளியேற்றுதல் மற்றும் அவர்களுடைய தீவிர இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் பொறுப்பாளர் மற்றும் கூற்று தகவல் நாங்கள் முடிவு செய்து கொண்டு இலக்குகள் மற்றும் தீவிருப்பத்திற்கும் சிட்டைகள் இலக்கு பெறுதலை மேம்படுத்துகிறது மற்றும் அது தங்கக் கூறுகள் உட இது சரியான கிடைக்கப்பட்ட உணர்வு தரவுத்தளங்களுக்கான வெளிப்பாட்டின் முக்கியமான முக்கியமானதை குறிப்ப அதே நேரத்தில், எங்கள் முடிவுகள் காட்டுகிறது தற்போதைய மாதிரிகளின் செயல்பாடு தூர வெளிப்படுத்துவது ஏழாகும், இந்த தகவல் பயனற்', 'ur': 'پاکیزہ غلاموں کی تحقیقات کی کوشش کرتی ہے کہ احساس حاصل کرنے والوں کو اٹھا لیں اور ان کے درمیان رابطہ حل کریں، لیکن تحقیقات کے مشکل سے اٹھانے کی کوشش کرتی ہے. ہدایت کی احساسات تحلیل، دوسری طرف سے، ایک زیادہ تنگ کام ہے، جو احساسات نشانیوں کو اٹھانے اور ان کی آلودگی کا کلاس کرتا ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ ہلڈر اور اثرات معلومات میں شامل ہونے کے لئے موقع اضافہ اور کلاسپیٹ کا بہتر کرسکتے ہیں اور آٹھ انگلیسی ڈاٹ سٹ پر آزمائش کرسکتے ہیں. ہم تصمیم لیتے ہیں کہ موقع اور قطعیت کی پیش بینی کی جاتی ہے BIO لیبل موقعیت اضافہ کی جاتی ہے، اور یہ کہ سونے کے اضافہ سے اضافہ کی جاتی ہے، عموماً موقعیت قطعہ کی جاتی ہے. یہ اظہار کرتا ہے کہ پاکیزہ دانہ ڈیٹسٹ کے لئے اظہار کرنے کی امکانات کا اظہار ہے. اسی طرح، ہمارے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ موجود موڈلز کی پیش بینی کے لئے کمزور ہے، اس معلومات کے فائدہ کو آزمائش میں دھوکا دیتے ہیں.', 'si': 'හොඳ විශේෂ විශ්ලේෂණය හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා හොඳ විශ්ලේෂණය, අරක්ෂණය සහ ප්\u200dරතිකාරය සම්බන්ධය සම්බන්ධ විශ්ලේෂණය, ඒත්  අනිත් පැත්තෙන්, ඉලක්කල දැනුම් විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණයක්, තරම් සංකීර්ණ වැඩක්, දැනුම් ලක්ෂණ ලක්ෂණ අරගෙන ඉ මේ පත්තරේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා අයිතිකාරය සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනය තොරතුරු සඳහා ඉලක්ෂාව පිළිගන්න සහ විශේෂණය සඳහා ඉං අපි අවස්ථාව කරනවා සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරන්නේ ඉලක්කය සහ ප්\u200dරමාණය BIO ලේබල්ස් ඉලක්කය ප්\u200dරමාණය විස්තර කරනවා, ඒ වගේම සුන්ධ ප්\u200dරම මේක පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් වැදගත් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරන්න. එකම වෙලාවක්, අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයේ මොඩේල් එකේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළ', 'no': 'Fin-grensert sentimentanalyse prøver å pakka ut sentimenthaldar, mål og polar uttrykk og løysa forholdet mellom dei, men framgang er avbrytt av vanskeligheten for annotasjon. Målet sentimentanalyser, på den andre siden, er ein mer sterk oppgåve, som fokuserer på å ekstrahera sentimentemål og klassera polariteten sine. I denne papiret utforskar vi om inkluderte informasjon om holder og uttrykk kan forbetra mål ekstrahering og klassifikasjon og utføra eksperimenter på åtte engelske datasett. Vi avsluttar at merkelappen for BIO-merkelappen som er samanlig forventa mål og polaritet forbetrar mål-ekstrahering, og at å auka inndata-teksten med gull-uttrykk forbetrar generelt målte polaritetsklassifikasjon. Dette markerer potensielle viktigheten for å merka uttrykk for fylte sentimentdatasett. Samtidig viser resultatet våre at utviklinga av gjeldande modeller for å foregå polar uttrykk er fattig, og hindrar fordel av denne informasjonen i praksis.', 'mn': 'Шинэ сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээ нь сэтгэл хөдлөл, зорилго, гадаргуу илэрхийлэл, тэдний хоорондын харилцааныг шийдэхэд оролдсон. Гэхдээ хөгжлийн хэцүү хэцүү байдалд хүргэсэн. Нөгөө талаас мэдрэмжтэй санааны шинжилгээ нь илүү хатуу ажил, мэдрэмжтэй зорилгоог гаргаж, тэдний зайлшгүй байдлыг ангилалдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид холбоотой болон илэрхийллийн мэдээллийг нэмэгдүүлж 8 Англи өгөгдлийн санд туршилт хийж чадах эсэхийг судалж байна. Бид хамтдаа зорилго болон загварын талбайг таамаглах нь зорилготой татах загварыг сайжруулдаг. Алтан илэрхийлэлтэй орнуудын текстийг нэмэгдүүлэх нь ихэвчлэн зорилготой загварын талбайг сайжруулдаг. Энэ нь сэтгэл санааны өгөгдлийн санааны тухай илэрхийлэл илэрхийлэх боломжтой чухал зүйлийг тодорхойлж байна. Гэтэл бидний үр дүн нь уламжлалтай илэрхийллийг таамаглах одоогийн загварын үйл ажиллагаа ядуу гэдгийг харуулж байна. Энэ мэдээллийн хэрэгцээг дасгал хийх боломжтой.', 'uz': "Ularning orasidagi hissiyotni aniqlash qo'llanmalarni, shaxsiy va polar ifodalarini ajratish va ularning orasidagi munosabatlarni ajratish uchun harakat qiladi, lekin davomida tajriba juda qiziqaradi. Boshqa bir tomondan hissiyot analyzeri juda qisqa vazifa, hissiyotning maqolalarini ajratish va ularning shaxsiyatlarini ajratish mumkin. Bu hujjatda, biz qoʻllanmalar va ifodalarni qo'shish va tashkilotni ajratish va sakkizcha ingliz maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi imtiyozni bajarish mumkin. Biz shunday tugatamiz, birlashtirilgan goal va polariyasi BIO labellarini qanday ajratishni oshirish imkoniyatini oshirish mumkin. Bu narsalarni gull ifodalari bilan qo'shish umuman qanday qanday bog'liq darajasini oshirish mumkin. Name Shunday paytda, bizning natijalarimiz esa bu maʼlumotning foydalanishini o'zgartirish uchun joriy modellar bajarishini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Phân tích cảm xúc phong phú tìm ra các người ủng hộ, mục tiêu và biểu hiện vùng cực và giải quyết mối quan hệ giữa họ, nhưng sự tiến bộ đã bị cản trở bởi sự khó khăn của ghi chú. Điểm mấu chốt phân tích cảm xúc, mặt khác, là một nhiệm vụ thu hẹp hơn, tập trung vào việc khai thác các mục tiêu tình cảm và phân loại các quan điểm của chúng. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi sẽ tìm hiểu xem có thể cung cấp thông tin về người chứa và biểu thức có thể cải thiện kích thước và phân loại mục tiêu và thực hiện thí nghiệm trên tám bộ dữ liệu Anh không. Chúng tôi kết luận rằng dự đoán đích và các nhãn cực khác nhau của BIO cải thiện việc khai thác mục tiêu, và tăng cường chữ nhập bằng biểu hiện vàng thường cải thiện mật độ phân cực tiêu chuẩn. Điều này nhấn mạnh khả năng quan trọng của thuật ngữ chú thích cho các tập tin cảm xúc. Tuy nhiên, kết quả của chúng tôi cho thấy khả năng dự đoán biểu hiện của các biểu tượng vùng cực rất kém, làm ảnh hưởng đến lợi ích của thông tin này trong thực tế.', 'da': 'Finkornet følelsesanalyse forsøger at udtrække følelsesindholdere, mål og polære udtryk og løse forholdet mellem dem, men fremskridt er blevet hæmmet af vanskeligheden med at notere. Målrettet sentimentalanalyse er derimod en mere snæver opgave, der fokuserer på at udtrække sentimentalmål og klassificere deres polaritet. I denne artikel undersøger vi, om indarbejdelse af indehaver- og udtryksinformation kan forbedre målekstraktion og klassificering og udføre eksperimenter på otte engelske datasæt. Vi konkluderer, at forudsigelse af mål- og polaritetsmærker i fællesskab forbedrer målekstraktionen, og at forøgelse af input teksten med guldudtryk generelt forbedrer målrettet polaritetsklassificering. Dette fremhæver den potentielle betydning af at kommentere udtryk for finkornede sentimentdatasæt. Samtidig viser vores resultater, at de nuværende modeller til forudsigelse af polare udtryk er dårlige, hvilket hæmmer fordelene ved disse oplysninger i praksis.', 'bg': 'Финозърнестият анализ на сантимента се опитва да извлече притежатели на сантимента, цели и полярни изрази и да реши връзката между тях, но напредъкът е възпрепятстван от трудността на анотацията. От друга страна, целевият анализ на сентимента е по-тясна задача, фокусирайки се върху извличането на сентиментални цели и класифицирането на тяхната полярност. В тази статия изследваме дали включването на информация за притежателя и израза може да подобри извличането и класификацията на целевите цели и да извършим експерименти върху осем английски набора от данни. Стигаме до заключението, че съвместното прогнозиране на целевите и полярните БИО етикети подобрява извличането на целевите цели и че увеличаването на входния текст със златни изрази като цяло подобрява целевата класификация на полярността. Това подчертава потенциалното значение на анотирането на изрази за фини набори от данни за сентименти. В същото време нашите резултати показват, че представянето на настоящите модели за прогнозиране на полярните изрази е слабо, което затруднява ползата от тази информация на практика.', 'nl': 'Een fijnkorrelige sentimentanalyse probeert sentimenthouders, doelen en polaire uitdrukkingen te extraheren en de relatie tussen hen op te lossen, maar vooruitgang wordt belemmerd door de moeilijkheid van annotatie. Een gerichte sentimentanalyse daarentegen is een nauwere taak, waarbij de nadruk ligt op het extraheren van sentimentdoelen en het classificeren van hun polariteit. In dit artikel onderzoeken we of het opnemen van houder- en expressiegegevens de extractie en classificatie van doelwitten kan verbeteren en voeren we experimenten uit op acht Engelse datasets. We concluderen dat het gezamenlijk voorspellen van doel- en polariteitslabels de doelextractie verbetert, en dat het uitbreiden van de invoertekst met gouden uitdrukkingen over het algemeen de gerichte polariteitsclassificatie verbetert. Dit benadrukt het potentiële belang van het annoteren van expressies voor fijnkorrelige sentimentdatasets. Tegelijkertijd tonen onze resultaten aan dat de huidige modellen voor het voorspellen van polaire expressies slecht presteren, wat het voordeel van deze informatie in de praktijk belemmert.', 'hr': 'Analiza finog zrnca osjećaja pokušava izvući držače osjećaja, ciljeve i polarne izraze i riješiti odnos između njih, ali napredak je ometao teškoća annotacije. Ciljna analiza osjećaja, s druge strane, suža je zadatak, fokusirana je na izvlačenje ciljeva osjećaja i klasifikaciju njihove polarnosti. U ovom papiru istražujemo da li uključujući informacije o vlasniku i izrazu mogu poboljšati izvlačenje i klasifikaciju ciljeva i izvršiti eksperimente na osam engleskih podataka. Zaključili smo da zajednički predviđanje ciljnih i polarnih etiketa BIO-a poboljšava izvlačenje ciljeva i da povećanje ulaznog teksta s zlatnim izrazom obično poboljšava ciljnu klasifikaciju polarnosti. To ukazuje na potencijalnu važnost annotacije izraza za kompletne osjećaje. U isto vrijeme, naši rezultati pokazuju da je učinkovitost trenutnih modela za predviđanje polarnih izraza siromašna, ometanje koristi te informacije na praksi.', 'id': 'Analisis sentimen yang baik berusaha untuk mengekstrak pemegang sentimen, sasaran dan ekspresi kutub dan menyelesaikan hubungan antara mereka, tapi kemajuan telah diganggu oleh kesulitan anotasi. Targeted sentiment analysis, on the other hand, is a more narrow task, focusing on extracting sentiment targets and classifying their polarity.  Dalam kertas ini, kami mengeksplorasi apakah memasukkan informasi pemegang dan ekspresi dapat meningkatkan ekstraksi dan klasifikasi sasaran dan melakukan eksperimen pada delapan set data Inggris. Kami menyimpulkan bahwa bersama-sama memprediksi target dan polaritas label BIO meningkatkan ekstraksi target, dan bahwa meningkatkan teks input dengan ekspresi emas umumnya meningkatkan klasifikasi polaritas target. Ini menyatakan penting potensial dari ekspresi anotasi untuk set data sentimen yang sempurna. Pada saat yang sama, hasil kita menunjukkan bahwa prestasi model saat ini untuk memprediksi ekspresi kutub adalah buruk, menghalangi keuntungan dari informasi ini dalam praktek.', 'de': 'Feingranulare Stimmungsanalysen versuchen, Stimmungshalter, Ziele und polare Ausdrücke zu extrahieren und die Beziehung zwischen ihnen zu lösen, aber Fortschritte wurden durch die Schwierigkeit der Annotation behindert. Die gezielte Stimmungsanalyse hingegen ist eine engere Aufgabe, die sich auf die Extraktion von Stimmungszielen und die Klassifizierung ihrer Polarität konzentriert. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir, ob die Integration von Halter- und Expressionsinformationen die Extraktion und Klassifizierung von Zielen verbessern kann und führen Experimente an acht englischen Datensätzen durch. Wir schlussfolgern, dass die gemeinsame Vorhersage von Ziel- und Polaritäts-BIO-Labels die Zielextraktion verbessert, und dass die Erweiterung des Eingabetextes mit goldenen Ausdrücken generell die gezielte Polaritätsklassifizierung verbessert. Dies unterstreicht die potenzielle Bedeutung der Annotation von Ausdrücken für feinkörnige Stimmungsdatensätze. Gleichzeitig zeigen unsere Ergebnisse, dass die Leistung aktueller Modelle zur Vorhersage polarer Ausdrücke schlecht ist, was den Nutzen dieser Informationen in der Praxis erschwert.', 'ko': '세립도 정서 분석은 정서 소유자, 목표, 극성 표현을 추출하고 관계를 해결하려 했지만 주석의 어려움으로 진전이 막혔다.다른 한편, 맞춤형 정서 분석은 더욱 좁은 임무로 정서 목표를 추출하고 극성을 분류하는 데 중점을 둔다.본고에서 우리는 holder와expression 정보를 결합시켜 목표 추출과 분류를 개선할 수 있는지를 연구했고 8개의 영어 데이터 집합에서 실험을 실시했다.우리가 얻은 결론은 연합 예측 목표와 극성 생물 라벨은 목표 추출을 향상시킬 수 있고gold 표현식으로 입력 텍스트를 증가하면 목표의 극성 분류를 향상시킬 수 있다는 것이다.이것은 세립도 정서 데이터 집합을 위한 주석 표현식의 잠재적 중요성을 두드러지게 한다.또한 우리의 결과에 의하면 현재 극좌표 표현식의 모델 성능이 비교적 떨어지고 이것은 실천에서 이러한 정보를 이용하는 데 방해가 된다.', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi mzuri wa hisia jaribio la kuondoa watu wenye hisia, malengo na hisia za pole na kutatua uhusiano baina yao, lakini maendeleo yamekuwa yakizunguzwa na matatizo ya uchunguzi. Uchambuzi wa hisia unaotarajiwa, kwa upande mwingine, ni kazi nyepesi zaidi, yenye lengo la kutengeneza malengo ya hisia na kutangaza uchaguzi wao. Katika gazeti hili, tunachunguza kama kumjumuisha wamiliki na taarifa za kujieleza zinaweza kuboresha utoaji na usambazaji na kutekeleza majaribio katika seti za takwimu nane za Kiingereza. Tunahitimisha kuwa alama za pamoja za kutabiri lengo na uchafuzi wa BIO zinaboresha utoaji wa malengo, na hiyo inaongeza ujumbe wa maandishi ya input kwa hisia za dhahabu kwa ujumla unaorezesha usambazaji wa uchafuzi unaotarajiwa. This highlights the potential importance of annotating expressions for fine-grained sentiment datasets.  Wakati huo huo, matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kwamba utendaji wa mifano ya sasa kwa kutabiri hisia za uchaguzi ni masikini, na kuharibu faida ya taarifa hizi katika mazoea.', 'fa': 'تحلیل احساسات پاکیزه سعی می\u200cکند که صاحبان احساسات، هدف\u200cها و تعریف\u200cهای قطعی را برداشته باشد و رابطه بین آنها حل کند، ولی پیشرفت توسط مشکلات اذیت را متوقف کرده است. تحلیل احساسات هدف، از طرف دیگر، یک کار کوتاه\u200cتر است که روی کشیدن هدف\u200cهای احساسات تمرکز می\u200cکند و کلاس\u200cبندی کردن قطعی\u200cشان است. در این کاغذ، ما تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که آیا اطلاعات حافظه\u200cکننده و تعریف\u200cکننده\u200cها می\u200cتوانند استخراج و مختصات هدف را بهبود دهند و آزمایش\u200cها را روی هشت مجموعه داده\u200cهای انگلیسی انجام دهند. ما نتیجه می\u200cدهیم که با همدیگر پیش\u200cبینی کردن هدف و نقطه\u200cای BIO برچسب\u200cهای هدف اخراج هدف را بهتر می\u200cکند، و این که افزایش متن وارد شدن با توضیح طلا معمولاً برچسب قطعیت هدف را بهتر می\u200cکند. این مهمترین احتمالات توضیح برای مجموعه\u200cهای احساسات پاکیزه را مشخص می\u200cکند. در همین زمان، نتیجه\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که عملکرد مدل\u200cهای فعلی برای پیش\u200cبینی کردن توضیح\u200cهای قطعه\u200cای فقیر است، که سود این اطلاعات را در تمرین محدود می\u200cکند.', 'af': "Fine-graad sentimentanalisie probeer om sentimenthouers, doels en polêre uitdrukkings te uittrek en die verhouding tussen hulle oplos, maar vordering is deur die moeilikheid van annotasie gekom. Teëlde sentimentanalisie, op die ander hand, is 'n meer sterk taak, fokus op die uittrek van sentimente doels en klassifiseer hulle polariteit. In hierdie papier, ons ondersoek of inkorporeerde houer en uitdrukking inligting kan die doel uittrekking en klasifikasie verbeter en eksperimente uitvoer op agt Engelske datastelle. Ons sluit dat joint voorskou doel en polariteit BIO etikette die doel uittrekking verbeter, en dat die ingevoerde teks met goud uitdrukkings generellik die doel van polariteit klasifikasie verbeter. Hierdie verlig die potensiele belangrikheid van annotering van uitdrukkings vir fyn- graad sentiment datastelle. In dieselfde tyd, ons resultate wys dat die prestasie van huidige modele vir die voorskou van polêre uitdrukkings is arm, die voordeel van hierdie inligting in praksie verminder.", 'sq': 'Analiza e ndjenjave me kokrra të holla përpiqet të nxjerrë mbajtësit e ndjenjave, objektivat dhe shprehjet polare dhe të zgjidhë marrëdhëniet midis tyre, por përparimi është penguar nga vështirësia e anotacionit. Analiza e ndjenjave të synuara, nga ana tjetër, është një detyrë më e ngushtë, duke u përqëndruar në nxjerrjen e objektivave të ndjenjave dhe klasifikimin e polaritetit të tyre. In this paper, we explore whether incorporating holder and expression information can improve target extraction and classification and perform experiments on eight English datasets.  Ne përfundojmë se parashikimi i përbashkët i etiketave të objektivit dhe polaritetit BIO përmirëson nxjerrjen e objektivit dhe se rritja e tekstit të hyrjes me shprehje ari përgjithësisht përmirëson klasifikimin e objektivit të polaritetit. Kjo thekson rëndësinë e mundshme të shfaqjes së shprehjeve për të dhënat e ndjenjave të holla. Në të njëjtën kohë, rezultatet tona tregojnë se paraqitja e modeleve aktuale për parashikimin e shprehjeve polare është e dobët, duke penguar përfitimin e këtij informacioni në praktikë.', 'tr': 'Gowy duýgular analyzasy duýgular çykyşlaryny, maksadlary we polar ifadeleri çykarmak we olaryň aralygyny çözmek üçin synanyşýar, ýöne ösümlik duýgular kynçylygyndan çykyp gitdi. Görevli duýgular analyzasy, beýleki tarapyndan, duýgular maksadyny çekmek we polaritylygyny klasifikasynda umydyr. Bu kagyzda, sahipleri we ifade maglumatynyň içine daşary bolup, maksady açmak we klasifikasyny gowylaşdyryp bilýändigini we sekiz Iňlisçe veri setirlerinde deneyler çykyp bilýändigini gözləýäris. Biz bir arada hedefi ve polaritet etiketlerini tahmin etmek için hedefi çıkarmayı geliştirdik ve gol ifadelerde giriş metini arttırmak genellikle hedefi polaritet klasifikasyonu geliştirir. Bu duýgular üçin ýagtylygy terjime etmek üçin mümkin wajyplygny ýagtylamaky mümkin edýär. Şol wagtda netijelerimiz polar ifadeleri önlemek üçin häzirki nusgalaryň täsirini görkezýär, bu informasiýanyň praktika etmäge täsirleýär.', 'hy': 'Փաստավոր զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը փորձում է դուրս բերել զգացմունքների պաշտպանները, նպատակները և հյուսիսային արտահայտությունները և լուծել դրանց միջև կապը, բայց առաջընթացը խոչընդոտում է նշումների դժվարությունը: Մյուս կողմից, նպատակային զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը ավելի խիստ խնդիր է, որը կենտրոնանում է զգացմունքների նպատակների վերացմանը և նրանց բնակչության դասակարգումը: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, արդյոք ընդգրկելը պահպանողի և արտահայտության ինֆորմացիայի կարող է բարելավել նպատակային վերացումը և դասակարգումը և կատարել փորձեր ութ անգլերեն տվ Մենք եզրակացնում ենք, որ միասին կանխատեսելը նպատակի և կողմնականության կենտրոնական պիտակները բարելավում է նպատակի դուրս բերումը, և որ ոսկու արտահայտություններով ներմուծի տեքստի աճը ընդհանրապես բարելավում է նպատակի կողմնականություն Սա նշանակում է նշումների արտահայտությունների պոտենցիալ կարևորությունը գեղեցիկ զգացմունքների տվյալների համակարգերի համար: Միևնույն ժամանակ, մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ հյուսիսային արտահայտությունների կանխատեսման ներկայիս մոդելների արդյունքը աղքատ է, ինչը կանգնեցնում է այս տեղեկատվության շահույթը:', 'bn': 'বিশ্লেষণের চেষ্টা হচ্ছে অনুভূতিপূর্ণ বিশ্লেষণ, লক্ষ্যবস্তুদের বের করে আনার এবং তাদের মধ্যে সম্পর্ক সমাধান করার চেষ্টা করছে, কিন্তু ক্ষোভের কষ্ট অন্যদিকে লক্ষ্য করা অনুভূতিবিশ্লেষণ হচ্ছে আরো সংকীর্ণ কাজ, আবেগের লক্ষ্য বের করে তাদের দূরীতির বিশ্লেষণের উপর মনোযোগ প্রদান করে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা পরীক্ষা করি যে হোল্ডার এবং প্রকাশের তথ্য যোগাযোগ করা যায় কি লক্ষ্যবস্তুতে বের করে আট ইংরেজি ডাটাসেটে পরীক্ আমরা উপসংহার প্রদান করেছি যে লক্ষ্য এবং দূরীতির লক্ষ্য এবং বিআইও লেবেলের সাথে লক্ষ্যবস্তুর বিনিময়ে উন্নতি প্রদান করে এবং সোনার প্রকাশ্যে ইনপুট টের ল এটি ভালো গ্রেফতার করা অনুভূতিপূর্ণ ডাটাসেটের ব্যাপারে ব্যাখ্যা করার সম্ভাব্য গুরুত্ব উল্লেখ করে। At the same time, our results show that performance of current models for predicting polar expressions is poor, hampering the benefit of this information in practice.', 'am': 'የተመሳሳይ አስተያየት፣ ተቃውሞ፣ መስኮቶች እና የባሕር መልዕክቶች ማውጣት ይፈልጋል፡፡ በተመሳሳይ የስሜት ትምህርት መተርጓሜ በተጨማሪው ስራ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ የጋቢ እና የንግግር መረጃ ማሳየት የግልፅ መረጃዎችን ለመግለጥ እና መግለጫ ማድረግ እና በስምንት ኢንግሊዝኛ ዳታተሮች ላይ ፈተናዎችን ማድረግ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የBIO ምልክቶች ማዕከላዊ ግንኙነት እንዲያበዛ እና የወርቅ መልዕክቶች እንዲያበዛ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ይህ የስሜት አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ የዳታ ማዕከላዎች የሚያስፈልገውን ያስታውሳል፡፡ በዚያው ሰዓት ፍሬታችን የአሁኑ የባሕር አካላት ማውጣት ድሀ ነው፣ የዚህን መረጃ ጥቅም በመቀበል የሚያስጨንቅ ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Düzgün hisslər analizi hisslər sahibləri, məqsədiləri və polar ifadələri çıxartmaq və onların arasındakı ilişkisini çəkmək üçün çalışır, amma tədbirlik məcburiyyətin çətinliklərindən çəkildi. Gördüyünüz hisslər analizi, digər tərəfindən, daha a ğır bir işdir, hisslərin məqsədilərini çıxartmaq və polarlıqlarını dəyişdirmək üçün odaqlanır. Bu kağızda, sahibləri və ifadə məlumatı inkişaf edən məlumatların məqsədilə çıxarılması və klasifikasyonu daha yaxşı təşkil edə biləcəyini və sekiz İngilizə veri qurulması üçün eksperimentləri təşkil edirik. Bizim sonuçlarımıza gəldik ki, məqsəd və polaritet etiketlərinin birlikdə tədbir edilməsi məqsəd əlaqəsini daha yaxşılaşdırır, və altın ifadələri ilə giriş metini artırmaq məqsədilə polaritet klasifikasyonu daha yaxşılaşdırır. Bu, süslü hisslər verilənlərinin ifadələrini bildirmək mümkünlüyünü işıqlandırır. Aynı zamanda, sonuçlarımız bu məlumatların faydasını çəkməsini göstərir ki, polar ifadələri təmin etmək üçün hazırkı modellərin performansı yoxsullardır.', 'cs': 'Jemnozrnná analýza sentimentů se snaží extrahovat držitele sentimentů, cíle a polární výrazy a vyřešit vztah mezi nimi, ale pokrok byl bráněn obtížností anotace. Cílená analýza sentimentů je naopak úzkým úkolem, který se zaměřuje na extrakci sentimentových cílů a klasifikaci jejich polarity. V tomto článku zkoumáme, zda začlenění informací o držácích a expresi může zlepšit extrakci a klasifikaci cílů a provádíme experimenty na osmi anglických datových sadách. Dospěli jsme k závěru, že společná predikce cílových a polaritních BIO štítků zlepšuje extrakci cílů a že rozšíření vstupního textu o zlaté výrazy obecně zlepšuje cílovou klasifikaci polarity. To zdůrazňuje potenciální význam anotování výrazů pro jemně zrnité datové sady sentimentů. Zároveň naše výsledky ukazují, že výkonnost současných modelů pro predikci polárních výrazů je špatná, což brání přínos těchto informací v praxi.', 'bs': 'Analiza finog zrnca osjećanja pokušava izvući držače osjećaja, ciljeve i polarne izraze i riješiti odnos između njih, ali napredak je ometao teškoća annotacije. Ciljna analiza osjećanja, s druge strane, je suža zadatak, fokusirana je na izvlačenje ciljeva osjećanja i klasifikaciju njihove polarnosti. U ovom papiru istražujemo da li uključujući informacije o državama i izrazu mogu poboljšati izvlačenje i klasifikaciju ciljeva i izvršiti eksperimente na osam engleskih podataka. Zaključili smo da zajednički predviđanje meta i polarnosti oznake BIO poboljšava izvlačenje meta i da povećanje ulaznog teksta sa zlatnim izrazom obično poboljšava ciljnu klasifikaciju polarnosti. To ukazuje na potencijalnu važnost annotacije izraza za kompletne sentimentalne podatke. U isto vrijeme, naši rezultati pokazuju da je izvođenje trenutnih modela za predviđanje polarnih izraza siromašno, ometanje koristi ove informacije na praksi.', 'et': 'Peeneteraline sentimentaalüüs püüab välja võtta sentimentaalseid hoidjaid, sihtmärke ja polaarseid väljendeid ning lahendada nendevahelised suhted, kuid edusamme on takistanud märgistamise raskus. Teisest küljest on suunatud sentimentaalüüs kitsam ülesanne, keskendudes sentimentaalsete sihtmärkide väljatöötamisele ja nende polaarsuse klassifitseerimisele. Käesolevas töös uurime, kas hoidja- ja väljenditeabe kasutamine võib parandada sihtmärgi ekstraheerimist ja klassifitseerimist ning teha katseid kaheksa inglise andmekogumiga. Järeldame, et sihtmärgi ja polaarsuse BIO märgiste ühisprognoosimine parandab sihtmärgi ekstraheerimist ning sisendteksti täiendamine kuldsete avaldistega parandab üldiselt sihtmärgi polaarsuse klassifikatsiooni. See rõhutab avaldiste märgistamise võimalikku tähtsust peenete sentimentaalsete andmekogumite puhul. Samal ajal näitavad meie tulemused, et praeguste polaarsete väljenduste prognoosimise mudelite jõudlus on kehv, mis takistab selle teabe kasulikkust praktikas.', 'ca': "Fine-grained sentiment analysis attempts to extract sentiment holders, targets and polar expressions and resolve the relationship between them, but progress has been hampered by the difficulty of annotation.  Per altra banda, l'anàlisi de sentiments mirat és una tasca més estreta, centrada en extrair objectius de sentiments i classificar la seva polaritat. En aquest paper, explorem si incorporar informació sobre titular i expressió pot millorar l'extracció i la classificació de mira i fer experiments en vuit conjunts de dades angleses. Conclouem que predir conjuntament les etiquetes de l'objectiu i la polaritat BIO millora l'extracció de l'objectiu, i que augmentar el text d'entrada amb expressions d'or millora generalment la classificació de la polaritat. Això destaca l'importància potencial d'anotar expressions per a conjunts de dades de sentiments fins. Al mateix temps, els nostres resultats demostren que el rendiment dels models actuals de predicció d'expressions polars és dolent, dificultant el benefici d'aquesta informació en la pràctica.", 'fi': 'Hienorakeisella tunteiden analyysillä pyritään poimimaan tunteiden haltijoita, kohteita ja polaarisia ilmauksia ja ratkaisemaan niiden välinen suhde, mutta edistymistä on vaikeuttanut huomautusten tekeminen. Kohdennettu tunteiden analysointi on toisaalta kapeampi tehtävä, jossa keskitytään tunteiden kohteiden poimimiseen ja niiden polariteetin luokitteluun. Tässä artikkelissa selvitämme, voiko haltija- ja ilmaisutiedon yhdistäminen parantaa kohteiden uuttamista ja luokittelua ja tehdä kokeita kahdeksalla englanninkielisellä aineistolla. Päätämme, että tavoite- ja polariteettitunnusten ennustaminen yhdessä parantaa kohteen uuttamista ja että syöttötekstin lisääminen kultalausekkeilla parantaa yleensä kohdennettua polariteettitunnusta. Tämä korostaa lausekkeiden merkitsemisen potentiaalista merkitystä hienojakoisille tunteiden tietojoukoille. Samalla tulokset osoittavat, että nykyisten polaariilmentymien ennustamismallien suorituskyky on heikko, mikä vaikeuttaa tiedon hyötyä käytännössä.', 'jv': 'OptionGroup Name Nang mapun iki, kita isih sabên kung nggawe aturan gawe lan informasi sing isih pergambar nggawe bukisar bukisar bukisar bukisar bukisar winih lan ingkang sampek dadi donêt-ingkang. ProgressBarUpdates Punika dipunangke sing dibutungano barang nggawe dataset sing dibutuhke Nejer neng berlak, kita sawetara dadi, akeh iso nggawe model sing gak nggawe ndheke sakjane, nik nggawe barang nggawe informasi iki ning praksi.', 'ha': "Anarari mai kyãwo na saurari ko da za'a sami saurari masu matsayi, filayen da maganar surar, kuma ya raba danganci a tsakanin su, kuma amma taƙaitaccen ya ba da haske mai zartar da shi. Targeted sentiment analysis, on the other hand, is a more narrow task, focusing on extracting sentiment targets and classifying their polarity.  Daga wannan takardan, Munã jarraba ko da za'a haɗa ma'abũcin tsari da magana ko zai iya ƙara zartar da shirin zartar da kuma kuma za'a sami jarrabi a kan tsarin takis na Ingiriya. Tuna ƙara cẽwa, labãrin BIO na gabatar da shirin gabatarwa da ƙayyadadde haske, yana ƙaranci matsayin inputi da magana na zĩnãriya, ko da yaushe yana ƙari sifilafin ƙayyadadde wanda aka yi goani. Wannan na ƙayyade muhimmin maganar ajiya wa daidaita danne-danne masu kifi. Kuma a samã shi, fassararmu ke nũna cewa mafarin misãlai da ke yanzu wa ka yi basĩri ga magana na kwanza ya zama matalauci, yana jin amfani da amfani da wannan maɓalli a cikin aikin.", 'sk': 'Drobnozrnata analiza čustva poskuša izvleči imetnike čustva, cilje in polarne izraze ter rešiti odnos med njimi, vendar je napredek ovirala težava pri označevanju. Po drugi strani pa je ciljna analiza čustva ozka naloga, ki se osredotoča na izvlečevanje čustvenih ciljev in razvrščanje njihove polarnosti. V tem prispevku raziskujemo, ali lahko z vključitvijo informacij o imetnikih in izrazih izboljšamo ekstrakcijo in klasifikacijo ciljev ter izvajamo poskuse na osmih angleških naborih podatkov. Sklepamo, da skupno napovedovanje nalepk BIO cilja in polarnosti izboljša ekstrakcijo cilja in da povečanje vhodnega besedila z zlatimi izrazi na splošno izboljša ciljno polarnost. To poudarja potencialni pomen označevanja izrazov za natančne nabore podatkov o občutkih. Hkrati naši rezultati kažejo, da je zmogljivost sedanjih modelov za napovedovanje polarnih izrazov slaba, kar ovira korist teh informacij v praksi.', 'he': 'ניתוח ניתוח רגשות מעולה מנסה לחלץ מחזיקי רגשות, מטרות ובטאות קוטביות ולפתור את מערכת היחסים ביניהם, אך התקדמות נמנעה על ידי הקשה של הערות. ניתוח רגשות מטורף, מצד שני, הוא משימה צמוקה יותר, מתמקד על החולץ מטרות רגשות והקלאס את הקוטביות שלהם. בעיתון הזה, אנו חוקרים אם הכילוי של מידע בעל וביטה יכול לשפר את החילוץ המטרה והקליזציה ולביצע ניסויים על שמונה קבוצות נתונים אנגליות. We conclude that jointly predicting target and polarity BIO labels improves target extraction, and that augmenting the input text with gold expressions generally improves targeted polarity classification.  זה מזכיר את החשיבות הפוטנציאלית של ביטויים מצביעים לקבוצות מידע רגשות מעולה. באותו הזמן, התוצאות שלנו מראות שהביצועים של דוגמנים הנוכחיים לחזות ביטויים קוטביים הם עניים, ומחסכים את היתרון של המידע הזה בפרקטיקה.', 'bo': 'རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སེམས་ཚོར་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིབ་ནི་ཚོར་བ་དང་བཅས་ཀྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དང་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་དང་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བ་དེ་ཚོར་ཡར་ལེན་བྱེད་ནི་དཀ དམིགས་ཡུལ་ཡོད་པའི་སེམས་ཚོར་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ན། ཕྱོགས་གཞན་ཞིག་ནི་ཚོར་བ་སྐྱེན་གྱིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆའི་དབུགས་ཆས་དང་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ We conclude that jointly predicting target and polarity BIO labels improves target extraction, and that augmenting the input text with gold expressions generally improves targeted polarity classification. འདིས་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱིས་མཐོང་རྐྱེན་པའི་གསལ་བརྗོད་ཚོར་མཚོན་པར་མཐོང་ཆོག་ཉེན་ཡིན། དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོའི་འབྲས་འབྲས་ཀྱིས་ད་ལྟོའི་མིག་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་གནོད་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Telling BERT’s Full Story : from Local Attention to Global Aggregation', 'ar': 'سرد القصة الكاملة لبيرت: من الاهتمام المحلي إلى التجميع العالمي', 'fr': "Raconter l'histoire complète du BERT\xa0: de l'attention locale à l'agrégation mondiale", 'es': 'Contar la historia completa de BERT: de la atención local a la agregación global', 'pt': 'Contando a história completa do BERT: da atenção local à agregação global', 'ja': 'バートのフルストーリーを伝える：現地の注目からグローバル集約へ', 'zh': '述BERT全事:自本地关注至全球聚', 'hi': 'BERT की पूरी कहानी बताना: वैश्विक एकत्रीकरण के लिए स्थानीय ध्यान से', 'ga': 'Ag Insint Scéal Iomlán BERT: Ó Aire Áitiúil go Comhiomlánú Domhanda', 'ru': 'Рассказ полной истории БЕРТА: от местного внимания к глобальной агрегации', 'hu': 'A BERT teljes történetének elmesélése: a helyi figyelemtől a globális aggregációig', 'el': 'Λέγοντας την πλήρη ιστορία του από την τοπική προσοχή στην παγκόσμια συγκέντρωση', 'ka': 'BERT-ის ყველა ისტორია: ლოკალური დაახლოებიდან გლობალური ადგრაციაზე', 'kk': 'BERT- тың толық оқиғасын айту: Жергілікті жалпы бірге қатынау', 'it': "Raccontare la storia completa di BERT: dall'attenzione locale all'aggregazione globale", 'lt': 'BERT visą istoriją pasakoti: nuo vietos dėmesio iki pasaulinio agregacijos', 'mk': 'Целосна приказна на Берт: од локално внимание до глобална група', 'ms': 'Memberitahu Stori Penuh BERT: dari Perhatian setempat ke Aggregasi Global', 'mt': 'Li tgħid l-istorja s ħiħa tal-BERT: mill-Attenzjoni Lokali sal-Aggregazzjoni Globali', 'mn': 'BERT-ийн бүрэн түүхийг хэлж байна: Орон нутгийн анхаарал дэлхийн нэгтгэл хүртэл', 'pl': 'Opowiadanie pełnej historii BERT: od lokalnej uwagi do globalnej agregacji', 'ro': 'Spunând povestea completă a BERT: de la atenția locală la agregarea globală', 'ml': 'ബെര്\u200dട്ടിന്റെ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ കഥ പറയുന്നത്: ലോക്കല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും ഗ്ലോബല്\u200d കൂട്ടം', 'sr': 'Prièam sa BERT-ovom punom prièom: od lokalne pažnje na globalnu agregaciju', 'si': 'BERT ගේ සම්පූර්ණ කතාව කියන්න: ස්ථානික අවධානයෙන් ජාතික සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ', 'so': "Telling BERT's Full Story: from Local Attention to Global Aggregation", 'no': 'Tel BERT sin fulle historie: frå lokale merking til globale samlingar', 'sv': 'Berätta BERT:s fullständiga historia: från lokal uppmärksamhet till global aggregering', 'ta': 'பிரெட்டின் முழு வரலாற்றை சொல்லும்', 'ur': 'BERT کی پوری کہانی بتاتے ہیں: محلی توجه سے Global Aggregation تک', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Câu chuyện đầy đủ của Berlin: từ chú ý đến s ự tập hợp to àn cầu', 'nl': "BERT's volledige verhaal vertellen: van lokale aandacht tot wereldwijde aggregatie", 'bg': 'Разказване на цялата история на Берт: от местното внимание до глобалната агрегация', 'da': "Fortæl BERT's fulde historie: fra lokal opmærksomhed til global aggregering", 'de': 'BERTs vollständige Geschichte erzählen: von der lokalen Aufmerksamkeit bis zur globalen Aggregation', 'hr': 'Priča o BERT-ovoj punoj priči: od lokalne pažnje na globalnu skupinu', 'id': 'Menceritakan Cerita Penuh BERT: dari Perhatian Lokal ke Aggregasi Global', 'fa': 'گفتن داستان کامل BERT: از توجه محلی به گروهی جهانی', 'sw': 'Kusimulia hadithi kamili ya BERT: kutoka kwa Mahojiano ya Ndani na Kuhusiana na Kimataifa', 'ko': '버트의 모든 이야기: 국부적인 관심에서 전 세계로 모이기', 'tr': "BERT'nin Tam Hikayesini Telling: from Local Attention to Global Aggregation", 'af': 'Vertel BERT se volle storie: van plaaslike aandag na globale samekoms', 'am': 'ከLocal Attention to Global Aggregation', 'az': "BERT'nin Tam Hikay…ôsini s √∂yl…ôyir: Yerli Dikkatind…ôn Qlobal ńįngiliz…ô", 'sq': 'Duke treguar historinë e plotë të BERT: nga vëmendja lokale në Aggregimin Global', 'hy': 'BER-ի ամբողջ պատմությունը պատմելը. տեղական ուշադրությունից մինչև գլոբալ համախմբումը', 'ca': "Contar la història completa del BERT: des de l'atenció local a l'agregació global", 'cs': 'Vyprávění celého příběhu společnosti BERT: od lokální pozornosti k globální agregaci', 'bn': 'বের্টের সম্পূর্ণ গল্প বলা হচ্ছে: স্থানীয় মনোযোগ থেকে গ্লোবাল গ্রেগ্রেটিং থেকে', 'bs': 'Pričam o BERT-ovoj punoj priči: od lokalne pažnje na globalnu skupinu', 'et': 'BERTi kogu lugu rääkimine: kohalikust tähelepanust globaalse koondamiseni', 'fi': 'BERT:n koko tarinan kertominen: paikallisesta huomiosta globaaliin aggregaatioon', 'he': 'לספר סיפור מלא של BERT: מהתשומת לב מקומית לאיגוד גלובלי', 'ha': 'Phonon:: MMF:: EffectFactory', 'sk': 'Pripovedovanje celotne zgodbe BERT: od lokalne pozornosti do globalne združitve', 'bo': "Telling BERT's Full Story: from Local Attention to Global Aggregation", 'jv': "teling BERT's Full Hikaya: from locale Attention to Global Asgregation"}
{'en': 'We take a deep look into the behaviour of self-attention heads in the transformer architecture. In light of recent work discouraging the use of attention distributions for explaining a model’s behaviour, we show that attention distributions can nevertheless provide insights into the local behaviour of attention heads. This way, we propose a distinction between local patterns revealed by attention and global patterns that refer back to the input, and analyze BERT from both angles. We use gradient attribution to analyze how the output of an attention head depends on the input tokens, effectively extending the local attention-based analysis to account for the mixing of information throughout the transformer layers. We find that there is a significant mismatch between attention and attribution distributions, caused by the mixing of context inside the model. We quantify this discrepancy and observe that interestingly, there are some patterns that persist across all layers despite the mixing.', 'es': 'Analizamos en profundidad el comportamiento de las cabezas de autoatención en la arquitectura de los transformadores. A la luz del trabajo reciente que desalienta el uso de distribuciones de atención para explicar el comportamiento de un modelo, mostramos que las distribuciones de atención pueden, sin embargo, proporcionar información sobre el comportamiento local de los cabezales de atención. De esta manera, proponemos una distinción entre los patrones locales revelados por la atención y los patrones globales que se refieren a la entrada, y analizamos BERT desde ambos ángulos. Utilizamos la atribución de gradientes para analizar cómo la salida de una cabeza de atención depende de los tokens de entrada, ampliando efectivamente el análisis local basado en la atención para tener en cuenta la mezcla de información en todas las capas del transformador. Encontramos que hay un desajuste significativo entre las distribuciones de atención y atribución, causado por la mezcla de contexto dentro del modelo. Cuantificamos esta discrepancia y observamos que, curiosamente, hay algunos patrones que persisten en todas las capas a pesar de la mezcla.', 'pt': 'Analisamos profundamente o comportamento das cabeças de autoatenção na arquitetura do transformador. À luz de trabalhos recentes que desencorajam o uso de distribuições de atenção para explicar o comportamento de um modelo, mostramos que as distribuições de atenção podem, no entanto, fornecer insights sobre o comportamento local das cabeças de atenção. Dessa forma, propomos uma distinção entre padrões locais revelados pela atenção e padrões globais que remetem à entrada, e analisamos o BERT de ambos os ângulos. Usamos a atribuição de gradiente para analisar como a saída de uma cabeça de atenção depende dos tokens de entrada, estendendo efetivamente a análise baseada em atenção local para explicar a mistura de informações em todas as camadas do transformador. Descobrimos que há um descompasso significativo entre as distribuições de atenção e atribuição, causado pela mistura de contexto dentro do modelo. Quantificamos essa discrepância e observamos que, curiosamente, existem alguns padrões que persistem em todas as camadas, apesar da mistura.', 'fr': "Nous examinons en profondeur le comportement des têtes auto-attentionnées dans l'architecture des transformateurs. À la lumière de travaux récents qui découragent l'utilisation des distributions de l'attention pour expliquer le comportement d'un modèle, nous montrons que les distributions de l'attention peuvent néanmoins fournir des informations sur le comportement local des têtes attentives. De cette façon, nous proposons une distinction entre les modèles locaux révélés par l'attention et les modèles globaux qui renvoient à l'entrée, et analysons le BERT sous les deux angles. Nous utilisons l'attribution de gradient pour analyser comment la sortie d'une tête d'attention dépend des jetons d'entrée, étendant ainsi l'analyse locale basée sur l'attention pour tenir compte du mélange d'informations dans les couches du transformateur. Nous constatons qu'il existe un décalage important entre les distributions d'attention et d'attribution, en raison du mélange du contexte à l'intérieur du modèle. Nous quantifions cet écart et observons qu'il est intéressant de noter que certains motifs persistent dans toutes les couches malgré le mélange.", 'ja': '変圧器アーキテクチャにおける自己注目ヘッドの挙動を深く調べます。 最近の研究では、モデルの行動を説明するための注意分布の使用を推奨していないことを考慮すると、注意分布は、それでも注意ヘッドの局所的な行動に関する洞察を提供することができることを示しています。 このように、注意によって明らかになる局所パターンと、入力を参照するグローバルパターンの区別を提案し、両方の角度からBERTを分析します。 私たちは、注意ヘッドの出力が入力トークンにどのように依存するかを分析するために勾配帰属を使用し、トランス層全体の情報の混合を考慮するために局所的注意に基づく分析を効果的に拡張します。 注意と帰属分布の間には、モデル内の文脈の混合によって生じる著しい不一致があることがわかります。 私たちはこの矛盾を定量化し、興味深いことに、混合にもかかわらずすべての層にわたって持続するいくつかのパターンがあることを観察します。', 'zh': '深究变压器架构中自注意。 鉴近事不劝用意力分布以解模形之行,明注意力分布仍可供意头局行。 因此,我们发出注意力揭示的局部模式和引用输入的全局模式之间分别,并从两个角度分析BERT。 吾以梯度归因来析意头之输,赖于标记,有效而广之,以解全变压器层中之息。 观夫模上下文之混,意归因之间,有显不偶。 吾等量化此异,并观有趣者,虽有混合,犹有模样在层中。', 'hi': 'हम ट्रांसफॉर्मर आर्किटेक्चर में आत्म-ध्यान सिर के व्यवहार पर गहरी नज़र डालते हैं। एक मॉडल के व्यवहार को समझाने के लिए ध्यान वितरण के उपयोग को हतोत्साहित करने वाले हाल के काम के प्रकाश में, हम दिखाते हैं कि ध्यान वितरण फिर भी ध्यान प्रमुखों के स्थानीय व्यवहार में अंतर्दृष्टि प्रदान कर सकते हैं। इस तरह, हम ध्यान और वैश्विक पैटर्न द्वारा प्रकट स्थानीय पैटर्न के बीच एक अंतर का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो इनपुट को वापस संदर्भित करते हैं, और दोनों कोणों से BERT का विश्लेषण करते हैं। हम यह विश्लेषण करने के लिए ग्रेडिएंट एट्रिब्यूशन का उपयोग करते हैं कि एक ध्यान सिर का आउटपुट इनपुट टोकन पर कैसे निर्भर करता है, प्रभावी रूप से ट्रांसफॉर्मर परतों में जानकारी के मिश्रण के लिए स्थानीय ध्यान-आधारित विश्लेषण का विस्तार करता है। हम पाते हैं कि ध्यान और एट्रिब्यूशन वितरण के बीच एक महत्वपूर्ण बेमेल है, जो मॉडल के अंदर संदर्भ के मिश्रण के कारण होता है। हम इस विसंगति को मापते हैं और देखते हैं कि दिलचस्प बात यह है कि कुछ पैटर्न हैं जो मिश्रण के बावजूद सभी परतों में बने रहते हैं।', 'ar': 'نلقي نظرة عميقة على سلوك رؤساء الانتباه الذاتي في هندسة المحولات. في ضوء العمل الأخير الذي لا يشجع على استخدام توزيعات الانتباه لشرح سلوك النموذج ، نظهر أن توزيعات الانتباه يمكن مع ذلك توفير نظرة ثاقبة للسلوك المحلي لرؤساء الانتباه. بهذه الطريقة ، نقترح التمييز بين الأنماط المحلية التي كشف عنها الانتباه والأنماط العالمية التي تشير إلى المدخلات ، ونحلل BERT من كلا الزاويتين. نحن نستخدم الإحالة المتدرجة لتحليل كيفية اعتماد ناتج رأس الانتباه على الرموز المميزة للإدخال ، مما يوسع بشكل فعال التحليل المحلي القائم على الاهتمام لحساب خلط المعلومات عبر طبقات المحولات. وجدنا أن هناك عدم تطابق كبير بين توزيعات الانتباه والإحالة ، ناتج عن خلط السياق داخل النموذج. نقيس هذا التناقض ونلاحظ أنه من المثير للاهتمام ، أن هناك بعض الأنماط التي تستمر في جميع الطبقات على الرغم من الاختلاط.', 'ru': 'Глубоко изучаем поведение головок самовнимания в трансформаторной архитектуре. В свете недавней работы, не поощряющей использование распределения внимания для объяснения поведения модели, мы показываем, что распределение внимания, тем не менее, может дать представление о местном поведении руководителей внимания. Таким образом, мы предлагаем различие между локальными паттернами, выявленными вниманием, и глобальными паттернами, которые ссылаются на входные данные, и анализируем БЕРТА с обеих сторон. Мы используем атрибуцию градиента для анализа того, как выход головки внимания зависит от входных токенов, эффективно расширяя локальный анализ на основе внимания, чтобы учесть смешивание информации по всем слоям трансформатора. Мы обнаружили, что существует значительное несоответствие между распределением внимания и распределением атрибуции, вызванное смешением контекста внутри модели. Мы количественно оцениваем это расхождение и замечаем, что, что интересно, существуют некоторые закономерности, которые сохраняются во всех слоях, несмотря на смешивание.', 'ga': 'Breathnaímid go domhain ar iompar na gceannairí féin-aire in ailtireacht an chlaochladáin. I bhfianaise na hoibre a rinneadh le déanaí a dhíspreagann úsáid dáiltí aird chun iompar múnla a mhíniú, léirímid gur féidir le dáileadh aird, mar sin féin, léargais a sholáthar ar iompar áitiúil na gceannairí aird. Ar an mbealach seo, molaimid idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir patrúin áitiúla a nochtar aird agus patrúin dhomhanda a thagraíonn siar don ionchur, agus a dhéanann anailís ar BERT ón dá uillinn. Bainimid úsáid as sannadh grádáin chun anailís a dhéanamh ar an gcaoi a mbraitheann aschur ceann aird ar na comharthaí ionchuir, ag leathnú go héifeachtach an anailís aird-bhunaithe áitiúil chun cuntas a thabhairt ar mheascadh faisnéise ar fud na sraitheanna claochladáin. Faighimid amach go bhfuil neamhréir shuntasach idir dáiltí aird agus sannadh, de bharr meascadh comhthéacs laistigh den tsamhail. Déanaimid an neamhréireacht seo a chainníochtú agus tugaimid faoi deara, go suimiúil, go bhfuil roinnt patrún ann a leanann trasna gach sraithe in ainneoin an mheascadh.', 'hu': 'Mélyen megvizsgáljuk az önfigyelő fejek viselkedését a transzformátor architektúrájában. A modellek viselkedésének magyarázatához szükséges figyelmeztetési elosztások használatát visszatartó közelmúltbeli munkák fényében megmutatjuk, hogy a figyelmeztetési elosztások mindazonáltal betekintést nyújthatnak a figyelmeztetők helyi viselkedésébe. Így javasoljuk, hogy különbséget tegyünk a figyelem által feltárt helyi minták és globális minták között, amelyek visszautalnak a bemenetre, és elemezzük a BERT mindkét szögből. Gradient attribúciót használunk annak elemzésére, hogy egy figyelemfej kimenete hogyan függ a bemeneti tokenektől, hatékonyan kiterjesztve a helyi figyelem-alapú elemzést, hogy figyelembe vegye az információk keverését a transzformátor rétegeiben. Úgy találjuk, hogy jelentős eltérés van a figyelem és az attribúció eloszlása között, amit a kontextus keverése okoz a modellben. Számszerűsítjük ezt az eltérést, és megfigyeljük, hogy érdekes módon vannak olyan minták, amelyek minden rétegben fennmaradnak a keverés ellenére.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ძალიან გავაკეთებთ თავიდან აღმოჩენებული თავიდან აღმოჩენებული თავიდან აღმოჩენებული თავიდან აღმოჩენებული საქმე. ახლა სამუშაო მუშაობის გამოყენება მოდელის მონაცემების გახსნა, ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ მონაცემების გახსნა შეგვიძლია, მაგრამ მონაცემების გახსნა მხოლოდ მონაცემების მონაცემებ ასე, ჩვენ მუშაობთ ლოკალური მონაცემების განსხვავება, რომელიც აღმოჩვენებული მონაცემებით და გლობალური მონაცემებით, რომელიც დავუბრუნდება მონაცემებით და და ჩვენ გამოყენებთ გრადენტის ატრიბუცია ანალიზაციისთვის თუ როგორ ატრინსტრებერის ატრინსტრებერის ნაწილის შესაძლებლობა დაახლოებით ჩვენი შესაძლებლობაზე, როგორც ჩვენი შესაძლებლობა ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ, რომ არსებობს მნიშვნელოვანი არსებობა მოდელს შორის შესახებ და ატრიბუციების განყოფილებების შესახებ. ჩვენ კონტაქტირებთ ეს განსხვავებას და დაახლობთ, რომ ინტერესტიურად, არსებობს რამდენიმე მონაცემები, რომელიც ყველა ნაცემებზე მუშაობს, მაგრამ შემხვ', 'kk': 'Біз аударғыш архитектурасындағы өзіміздің бақылау әрекеттерінің қасиеттерін қарап қараймыз. Жуырдағы жұмыс үшін үлгі тәртібін түсіндіру үшін қызықтық дистрибуттарының пайдалануын бұғаттап, біз қызықтық дистрибуттарының түсіндіру мүмкіндігін көрсетуге болады. Бұл үшін біз жергілікті үлгілер мен әлемді үлгілер арасында қайта келтіріп, екі бұрыштан BERT- ті анализ етеді. Кіріс белгілеріне қалай тәуелді, жергілікті тәртіпке негізделген мәліметті түрлендіру үшін, мәліметті түрлендіру қабаттардың арасындағы түрлендіру үшін, градиенттің түрлендіру үші Біз үлгісінің ішінде контексті араластыру үшін маңызды қатынас мен бөлімдердің арасындағы маңызды сәйкес келеді деп ойлаймыз. Біз бұл бөліктерді есептеп, қызықтығын қараймыз. Бір қабаттардың бірнеше үлгілері бар.', 'it': "Diamo uno sguardo approfondito al comportamento delle teste di auto-attenzione nell'architettura dei trasformatori. Alla luce dei recenti lavori che scoraggiano l'uso delle distribuzioni dell'attenzione per spiegare il comportamento di un modello, mostriamo che le distribuzioni dell'attenzione possono tuttavia fornire approfondimenti sul comportamento locale dei capi dell'attenzione. In questo modo, proponiamo una distinzione tra modelli locali rivelati dall'attenzione e modelli globali che rimandano all'input, e analizziamo BERT da entrambe le angolazioni. Usiamo l'attribuzione del gradiente per analizzare come l'uscita di una testa di attenzione dipenda dai token di ingresso, estendendo efficacemente l'analisi locale basata sull'attenzione per tenere conto della miscelazione delle informazioni attraverso gli strati del trasformatore. Troviamo che c'è un significativo disallineamento tra attenzione e distribuzione di attribuzione, causato dalla mescolanza del contesto all'interno del modello. Quantifichiamo questa discrepanza e osserviamo che, in modo interessante, ci sono alcuni modelli che persistono su tutti gli strati nonostante la miscelazione.", 'lt': 'Mes atidžiai apžvelgiame savarankiško dėmesio galvų elgesį transformatoriaus architektūroje. Atsižvelgdami į neseniai atliktą darbą, kuris atgraso nuo dėmesio paskirstymo modelio elgesiui paaiškinti, mes rodome, kad dėmesio paskirstymas vis dėlto gali suteikti supratimą apie vietos dėmesio vadovų elgesį. Tokiu būdu siūlome atskirti vietos modelius, atskleidus dėmesio ir pasaulinius modelius, kurie atspindi įvestą informaciją, ir analizuoti BERT iš abiejų kampų. Naudojame gradientinį priskyrimą analizuojant, kaip dėmesio galvos išėjimas priklauso nuo įėjimo žymenų, veiksmingai išplečiant vietos dėmesiu pagrįstą analizę, kad būtų atsižvelgta į informacijos sumaišymą visuose transformatoriaus sluoksniuose. Mes manome, kad yra didelis dėmesio ir paskirstymo skirtumas dėl modelio konteksto sumaišymo. Mes kiekybiškai vertiname šį neatitikimą ir pastebime, kad, nepaisant maišymo, yra tam tikrų modelių, kurie išlieka visuose sluoksniuose.', 'ms': "We take a deep look into the behaviour of self-attention heads in the transformer architecture.  In light of recent work discouraging the use of attention distributions for explaining a model's behaviour, we show that attention distributions can nevertheless provide insights into the local behaviour of attention heads.  Dengan cara ini, kita mengusulkan perbezaan antara corak setempat yang diketahui oleh perhatian dan corak global yang rujuk kembali kepada input, dan menganalisis BERT dari kedua-dua sudut. Kami menggunakan atribut gradien untuk menganalisis bagaimana output kepala perhatian bergantung pada token input, secara efektif memperluas analisis berdasarkan perhatian setempat untuk akaun untuk campuran maklumat di seluruh lapisan penukar. Kami mendapati bahawa terdapat ketidaksepadan yang signifikan antara perhatian dan distribusi atribut, disebabkan oleh campuran konteks dalam model. Kita kuantifikasikan ketidaksamaan ini dan mengamati yang menarik, ada beberapa corak yang terus berlangsung di seluruh lapisan walaupun campuran.", 'mt': 'Aħna nħarsu fil-fond lejn l-imġiba tal-kapijiet tal-awtonomija fl-arkitettura tat-trasformatur. Fid-dawl tax-xogħol reċenti li jiskoraġġixxi l-użu tad-distribuzzjonijiet tal-attenzjoni biex jiġi spjegat l-imġiba ta’ mudell, nagħmlu evidenza li d-distribuzzjonijiet tal-attenzjoni madankollu jistgħu jipprovdu fehmiet dwar l-imġiba lokali tal-kapijiet tal-attenzjoni. B’dan il-mod, qed nipproponu distinzjoni bejn ix-xejriet lokali żvelati mill-attenzjoni u xejriet globali li jirreferu lura għall-input, u janalizzaw il-BERT miż-żewġ angoli. Aħna nużaw l-attribuzzjoni gradjenti biex janalizzaw kif ir-riżultat ta’ ras tal-attenzjoni jiddependi fuq it-tokens tal-input, billi b’mod effettiv jestendu l-analiżi lokali bbażata fuq l-attenzjoni biex jitqies it-taħlit tal-informazzjoni fis-saffi kollha tat-trasformatur. Aħna nsibu li hemm diskrepanza sinifikanti bejn id-distribuzzjonijiet tal-attenzjoni u tal-attribuzzjoni, ikkawżata mit-taħlit tal-kuntest ġewwa l-mudell. Nikkwantifikaw din id-diskrepanza u ninservaw li b’mod interessanti, hemm xi mudelli li jippersistu fis-saffi kollha minkejja t-taħlit.', 'mn': 'Бид өөрсдийгөө анхаарлаа хандуулах архитектур дээрх өөрсдийгөө анхаарлаа хандуулах үйл явдлыг гүн гүнзгий харах болно. Саяхан ажлын гэрэл загварын үйл ажиллагааг тайлбарлахын тулд анхаарлын хуваариллагааны хэрэглээ зогсоогүйгээр бид анхаарлын хуваариллагаа анхаарлын удирдлагын орон нутгийн үйл ажиллагаанд ойлголт өгч чадна. Иймээс бид орон нутгийн загварын хоорондын ялгааг санал болгож, анхаарлын болон ертөнцийн загваруудын хоорондын ялгааг нь харуулж, хоёр өнцгөөс нь BERT-г шинжилгээ хийдэг. Бид анхаарал төвлөрүүлэх толгойны үр дүнг хэрхэн оролцох тодорхойлолтуудаас хамааралтай талаар шалгахын тулд градиентын шалгалтыг хэрхэн ашиглаж, орон нутгийн анхаарал төвлөрүүлсэн шинжилгээг шинжилгээр шинжилгээ ши Бид загварын дотор орчин зүйлсийн хоорондоо анхаарлын төвлөрүүлэлт болон хуваарлын хоорондоо маш чухал ялгаатай байдаг. Бид энэ ялгааг тооцоолж, сонирхолтой байдлыг анзаарч үздэг. Бүх давхар давхар давхар давхар давхар байдаг.', 'el': 'Εξετάζουμε βαθιά τη συμπεριφορά των κεφαλών αυτοπροσοχής στην αρχιτεκτονική του μετασχηματιστή. Υπό το φως πρόσφατων εργασιών που αποθαρρύνουν τη χρήση κατανεμήσεων προσοχής για την εξήγηση της συμπεριφοράς ενός μοντέλου, καταδεικνύουμε ότι οι διανομές προσοχής μπορούν ωστόσο να δώσουν πληροφορίες για την τοπική συμπεριφορά των κεφαλών προσοχής. Με αυτόν τον τρόπο, προτείνουμε μια διάκριση μεταξύ τοπικών προτύπων που αποκαλύπτονται από την προσοχή και παγκόσμιων προτύπων που παραπέμπουν στην εισαγωγή, και αναλύουμε το BERT και από τις δύο γωνίες. Χρησιμοποιούμε την απόδοση κλίσης για να αναλύσουμε πώς η παραγωγή μιας κεφαλής προσοχής εξαρτάται από τα σήματα εισόδου, επεκτείνοντας αποτελεσματικά την τοπική ανάλυση βασισμένη στην προσοχή για να υπολογίσουμε την ανάμειξη πληροφοριών σε όλα τα στρώματα μετασχηματιστών. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι υπάρχει μια σημαντική ασυμφωνία μεταξύ των κατανεμήσεων προσοχής και αποδόσεων, που προκαλείται από την ανάμειξη του πλαισίου μέσα στο μοντέλο. Καταγράφουμε ποσοτικά αυτή τη διαφορά και παρατηρούμε ότι, κατά ενδιαφέρον, υπάρχουν κάποια μοτίβα που επιμένουν σε όλα τα στρώματα παρά την ανάμειξη.', 'pl': 'Przyglądamy się głęboko zachowaniu głowic samo-uwagi w architekturze transformatora. W świetle ostatnich prac zniechęcających do wykorzystania dystrybucji uwagi do wyjaśnienia zachowań modelu, pokazujemy, że dystrybucje uwagi mogą jednak dać wgląd w lokalne zachowanie głów uwagi. W ten sposób proponujemy rozróżnienie lokalnych wzorców ujawnionych przez uwagę a globalnych wzorców, które odnoszą się do danych wejściowych, i analizujemy BERT z obu stron. Używamy atrybucji gradientów do analizy, w jaki sposób wyjście głowicy uwagi zależy od tokenów wejściowych, skutecznie rozszerzając lokalną analizę opartą na uwadze, aby uwzględnić mieszanie informacji w warstwach transformatora. Stwierdzamy, że istnieje znacząca rozbieżność między rozkładami uwagi a atrybucji, spowodowana mieszaniem kontekstu wewnątrz modelu. Oszacowujemy tę rozbieżność i zauważamy, że co ciekawe, istnieją pewne wzorce, które utrzymują się na wszystkich warstwach pomimo mieszania.', 'mk': 'Гледаме длабоко во однесувањето на главите на себеси во трансформаторската архитектура. Со оглед на неодамнешната работа која го одбива употребата на дистрибуциите на вниманието за објаснување на однесувањето на моделот, покажуваме дека дистрибуциите на вниманието сепак можат да обезбедат информации за локалното однесување на главите на вниманието. На овој начин, предложуваме разлика помеѓу локалните шеми откриени од вниманието и глобалните шеми кои се враќаат назад на влогот и анализираат BERT од двата агла. Користиме атрибут на градиент за анализирање како излезот на главата на внимание зависи од вводните симболи, ефикасно ја проширувајќи локалната анализа базирана на внимание за да се одговори за мешањето на информациите низ сите слоеви на трансформаторот. Најдовме дека постои значителен несоглас помеѓу вниманието и дистрибуцијата на припишувањето, предизвикан од мешањето на контекстот во моделот. Ние ја квантификуваме оваа дискрепанција и забележуваме дека интересно, постојат некои шеми кои продолжуваат низ сите слоеви и покрај мешањето.', 'ro': 'Aruncăm o privire profundă asupra comportamentului capetelor de auto-atenție în arhitectura transformatorului. În lumina lucrărilor recente care descurajează utilizarea distribuțiilor atenției pentru explicarea comportamentului unui model, arătăm că distribuțiile atenției pot oferi totuși perspective asupra comportamentului local al liderilor atenției. În acest fel, propunem o distincție între modelele locale dezvăluite de atenție și modelele globale care se referă înapoi la intrare și analizăm BERT din ambele unghiuri. Utilizăm atribuirea gradientului pentru a analiza modul în care ieșirea unui cap de atenție depinde de jetoanele de intrare, extinzând efectiv analiza locală bazată pe atenție pentru a ține cont de amestecarea informațiilor în straturile transformatorului. Considerăm că există o neconcordanță semnificativă între distribuțiile de atenție și atribuire, cauzată de amestecarea contextului în interiorul modelului. Cuantificăm această discrepanță și observăm că, în mod interesant, există unele modele care persistă în toate straturile, în ciuda amestecării.', 'ml': 'സ്വയം ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന തലവന്മാരുടെ സ്വഭാവം നമ്മള്\u200d ആഴത്തോടെ നോക്കിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അടുത്ത പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിന്റെ പ്രകൃതിയെ വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, ശ്രദ്ധ വിതരണങ്ങള്\u200d എങ്കില ഈ വഴിയില്\u200d, ലോക്കല്\u200d മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വെളിപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഇന ഗ്രേഡിഗ്രേഡിയന്\u200d അക്രബ്രിപ്ഷന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ശ്രദ്ധ തലയുടെ ഫലം എങ്ങനെയാണ് ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതെന്ന് നാം അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നത് എന്ന് വിശദീകരിക് നമ്മള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നത് മോഡലിന്റെ ഉള്ളിലുള്ള കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d കണക്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനും ഇടയില്\u200d വളരെ പ്രധാനപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ഈ വ്യത്യാസം നമ്മള്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു എന്നിട്ട് ആഗ്രഹിക്കുന്ന ചില മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d മികച്ചിട്ടും കൂട', 'so': 'Waxaan aad u fiirinaynaa dabeecada madaxa iskuulka ah ee dhismaha bedelka. Markii shaqada la soo dhowaaday la qasbi karo isticmaalka iskuulaadka si loo caddeeyo dabeecada tusaale ahaan, waxaynu muujinaynaa in kastoo ay taxadar u kala soocmi karto daryeelka caafimaadka. Taas, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa kala duwan noocyada deegaanka oo lagu muujiyey taxadar iyo qaabab caalami ah, taas oo ku jeeda input-ka, baaritaanna BERT labada malag. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa faa’iido rasmi ah si aan u analyeyno sida ay soo bixinta madaxa attention ugu xiran tahay calaamada input, si faa’iido leh ayaannu u fidinaynaa baaritaanka deegaanka si loo xisaabiyo isku xiriirka macluumaadka ku saabsan cadaha wareejinta. Waxaynu ognahay in qallafsanaansho weyn u dhexeeya kalsoonaanta iyo qaybinta, taas oo sababtay isku xiriirka muusikada gudaheeda. Waxaannu qiimeynaynaa takoorkan, waxaana fiirinaynaa in wax xiiso leh, waxaa jira qaabab ka mid ah oo ku socda darafka oo dhan inkastoo ay isku xiranyihiin.', 'sr': 'Duboko pogledamo ponašanje glava samopouzdanja u transformacijskoj arhitekturi. S obzirom na nedavni rad koji ometa korištenje raspodjela pažnje za objašnjavanje ponašanja model a, pokazujemo da raspodjela pažnje ipak mogu pružiti uvid u lokalno ponašanje glava pažnje. Ovako predlažemo razliku između lokalnih obrazaca otkrivenog pažnjom i globalnim obrazacima koji se odnose na ulaz i analiziraju BERT iz oba ugla. Koristimo atribuciju gradienta kako bi analizirali kako izlaz glave pažnje zavisi od znakova ulaska, učinkovito proširenje lokalne pažnje bazirane analize da bi se računalo o miješanje informacija kroz transformacijske slojeve. Smatramo da postoji značajna nesporazuma između pažnje i raspodjela privrženja, uzrokovana pomešanjem konteksta unutar model a. Mi kvantificiramo ovu neslaganost i posmatramo to interesantno, postoje neki obrazac koji nastavljaju preko svih slojeva uprkos miješanju.', 'no': 'Vi gjer ein dyp sjå på atferden av selvmerksomhetskopten i transformeringsarkitekturen. I løpet av nyleg arbeid som avbrytar bruken av oppmerksdistribusjonar for å forklare oppførsel til eit modell, viser vi at oppmerksdistribusjonar kan likevel gje innsyningar i den lokale oppførsel av oppmerkshoda. I denne måten foreslår vi ein skilnad mellom lokale mønsterer som viser av oppmerksomhet og globale mønsterer som refererer tilbake til inndata og analyserer BERT frå begge vinkler. Vi bruker fargeovergangslinjen for å analysera korleis utgangen av ein oppmerksomhetskop avhengig av inntekens, og effektivt utvidar den lokale oppmerksomhetsbaserte analysen til konto for å blanda informasjon gjennom transformeringslag. Vi finn at det finst ein signifikant ikkje samsvar mellom oppmerksomheten og attribusjonsdistribusjonar, forårsaket av blanden av konteksten i modellen. Vi kvantifiserer denne ulikheten og observerer at interessant er det noen mønsterelement som persisterer over alle lag, selv om blanden.', 'sv': 'Vi tar en djupgﾃ･ende titt pﾃ･ beteendet hos sjﾃ､lvuppmﾃ､rksamhetshuvuden i transformatorarkitekturen. Mot bakgrund av det senaste arbetet som motverkar anvﾃ､ndningen av uppmﾃ､rksamhetsfﾃｶrdelningar fﾃｶr att fﾃｶrklara en modells beteende visar vi att uppmﾃ､rksamhetsfﾃｶrdelningar ﾃ､ndﾃ･ kan ge insikter i uppmﾃ､rksamhetsfﾃｶrdelningarnas lokala beteende. Pﾃ･ sﾃ･ sﾃ､tt fﾃｶreslﾃ･r vi en ﾃ･tskillnad mellan lokala mﾃｶnster som avslﾃｶjas av uppmﾃ､rksamhet och globala mﾃｶnster som hﾃ､nvisar tillbaka till indata, och analyserar BERT frﾃ･n bﾃ･da vinklarna. Vi anvﾃ､nder gradient attribution fﾃｶr att analysera hur utgﾃ･ngen av ett uppmﾃ､rksamhetshuvud beror pﾃ･ inmatningsteckenerna, vilket effektivt utﾃｶkar den lokala uppmﾃ､rksamhetsbaserade analysen fﾃｶr att ta hﾃ､nsyn till blandningen av information genom transformatorlagren. Vi finner att det finns en betydande missmatchning mellan uppmﾃ､rksamhets- och tilldelningsfﾃｶrdelningar, orsakad av blandning av sammanhang inuti modellen. Vi kvantifierar denna avvikelse och observerar att det intressant nog finns vissa mﾃｶnster som kvarstﾃ･r ﾃｶver alla lager trots blandningen.', 'ur': 'ہم اپنی ذات کے سروں کی رفتار میں سیدھی نگاہ کرتے ہیں تبدیل کرنے والے معماری میں۔ اچھے کاموں کے نور میں ایک موڈل کے رفتار کی توضیح کے لئے توجه کے تقسیم کے استعمال کو دھوکا دیتے ہیں، ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ توجه کے تقسیم کے ذریعے ذریعے سروں کے محلی رفتار میں بصیرت حاصل کرسکتے ہیں. اسی طرح، ہم نے محلی پٹرانوں کے درمیان ایک فرق پیش کرتا ہے جو توجه اور گلوبی پٹرانوں کے ذریعہ ظاہر ہوتی ہے جو ان کے سوال کی طرف واپس پلٹتے ہیں، اور دونوں زاویوں سے BERT کو تحقیق کرتے ہیں. ہم گراڈینٹ کی تعریف کے لئے استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ توجه کے سر کا اپوٹٹ کس طرح اپنا اپوٹ کس طرح اپنا اپوٹ ٹوکنز پر آئندہ ہوتا ہے، موکل توجه کی تحلیل کو تغییر پھیلانے کے لائق میں معلومات کی مmix کے ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ توجه اور تقسیم تقسیم کے درمیان ایک بڑی غلطی ہے، جو مدل کے اندر متوسط کی مخلوط کی وجہ سے ہوتی ہے. ہم اس اختلاف کا اندازہ کررہے ہیں اور دیکھتے ہیں کہ دلچسپ سے کچھ الگوں ہیں جو مخلوقات کے بغیر مخلوقات پر قائم ہیں', 'si': 'අපි ගොඩක් බලාපොරොත්තු කරනවා ස්වයං අවධානයක් තියෙන්නේ ස්වයං බලාපොරොත්තු ස්ථාපනයට. අලුත් වැඩේ ප්\u200dරකාශයක් නැති වෙනුවෙන් අවධානයක් විතරය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අවධානයක් විතරයින් අවධානය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කර මෙහෙම විදියට, අපි ස්ථානික පෙට්ටර් අතර පිළිබඳින්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් කරනවා ස්ථානික පෙට්ටර් අතර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  අපි ග්\u200dරේඩියෙන්ට් සැකසුම් විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා කොහොමද අවධානයක් ඔළුවන්ගේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200d අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් අවධානය සහ අවධානය විතරය අතර විශාලයක් තියෙනවා කියලා, මොඩේල් ඇතුලේ සංවේදනය අපි මේ විරුද්ධ විකල්පයක් ගණන් කරනවා ඒක ප්\u200dරශ්නයෙන් බලන්න, මිස්සු විකල්පයක් තියෙන්නේ සියළු ස්තූතිය', 'ta': 'நாம் மாற்றும் அமைப்புகளில் தன்னை கவனம் தலைவர்களின் நடத்தையை ஆழமாக பார்க்க வேண்டும். சமீபத்தில் வேலையின் வெளிப்படுத்தலை கவனத்தை விளக்குவதற்கான பயன்படுத்தலை குறைக்கும் பொழுது நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம், ஆனாலும் கவனம் விரிவாக் இந்த வழியில், நாம் உள்ளீட்டிற்கு மீண்டும் குறிப்பிடும் உள்ளீட்டிற்கு பிரிட்டு இரு கோணங்களில் இருந்தும் பிரிட்டை விள நாம் ஒரு கவனத்தின் தலைப்பின் வெளியீட்டை எவ்வாறு சார்ந்தது என்பதை அறிவிக்க பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், உள்ளீட்டு குறியீடு மாதிரியின் உள்ளே கலப்பு மூலம் காரணமாக, கவனத்திற்கும் பங்கீட்டுக்கும் இடையே ஒரு முக்கியமான பொருத்தம் உள்ளது. இந்த வேறுபாட்டை நாம் குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் சுவாரஸ்யமாக, கலப்பு போன்ற பிறகு எல்லா அடுக்குகளிலும் சில ம', 'vi': 'Chúng ta sẽ tìm hiểu sâu về hành vi của những kẻ tự chú ý trong kiến máy biến đổi. Dựa trên những nghiên cứu gần đây làm nản lòng việc phân chia s ự chú ý để giải thích hành vi của mô hình, chúng tôi cho thấy phân chia sự chú ý có thể cung cấp cho ý thức về hành vi của những người chăm sóc. Bằng cách này, chúng tôi đề xuất sự phân biệt giữa các mô hình địa phương được phát hiện bởi sự chú ý và các mô hình to àn cầu có liên quan đến kết nhập, và phân tích BERT từ cả hai góc. Chúng tôi dùng thuật phân tích độ phân tích làm thế nào kết xuất của một đầu tập trung phụ thuộc vào các vật nhập, mở rộng các phân tích chú ý địa phương để giải thích việc trộn thông tin qua các lớp chuyển hóa. Chúng tôi thấy có sự trùng hợp đáng kể giữa phân phát sự chú ý và phân bổ trách nhiệm, do sự hoà trộn bối cảnh bên trong mô hình. Chúng tôi định lượng sự khác biệt này và quan tâm rằng, có một số mô hình vẫn còn tồn tại trên tất cả các lớp bất chấp sự pha trộn.', 'uz': "Biz o'zgarishni o'zgartirish tuzuvchidagi o'zgarishni o'zgartiraymiz. Yaqinda ishni tahrirlash uchun modelning xususiyatlarini aniqlash uchun foydalanishni yoqtiradigan paytda, biz murakkab tarqatish tarqatishni hozir qilamiz, ammo lokal taqdim boshqaruvchilarga ko'rinishi mumkin. Bu yerda, biz lokal shakllar bilan taqdimot va dunyo shakllari bilan ajratishni tahlil qilamiz va ikkita angldan BERT tarjima qilamiz. Biz tashkilotni ajratuvchi boshqaruvchining natijasi qanday ishlatiladi, lokal taʼminlovchi taʼlumotni ajratuvchi qanday o'zgarishlar qatlaridagi maʼlumotni o'zgartirish uchun lokal paydo bo'ladi. Biz o'ylaymiz, bu modelning ichida tarqatish muvaffaqiyatlari va taxminan tarqatish orasidagi juda katta yo'q. Biz bu fikrlarni aniqlamamiz va qiziqarli bo'lganligimizni ko'rganamiz. Ko'pchilik bo'lsa, hamma qatlamlarda ko'p shakllar bor.", 'bg': 'Разглеждаме дълбоко поведението на самовнимателните глави в архитектурата на трансформаторите. В светлината на неотдавнашните изследвания, които обезкуражават използването на разпределения на вниманието за обясняване на поведението на модела, ние показваме, че разпределението на вниманието все пак може да даде представа за местното поведение на главите на вниманието. По този начин предлагаме разграничение между локалните модели, разкрити от вниманието, и глобалните модели, които се отнасят обратно към входа, и анализираме BERT от двата ъгъла. Използваме градиентното приписване, за да анализираме как изходът на главата на вниманието зависи от входните токени, като ефективно разширяваме локалния анализ, основан на вниманието, за да отчетем смесването на информация в трансформаторните слоеве. Установяваме, че има значително несъответствие между разпределенията на вниманието и приписването, причинено от смесването на контекста в модела. Изчисляваме количествено това несъответствие и забелязваме, че интересното е, че има някои модели, които продължават във всички слоеве въпреки смесването.', 'da': 'Vi tager et dybt kig på selvopmærksomhedens opførsel i transformatorarkitekturen. I lyset af det seneste arbejde, der afskrækker brugen af opmærksomhedsfordelinger til at forklare en models adfærd, viser vi, at opmærksomhedsfordelinger alligevel kan give indsigt i opmærksomhedshovedernes lokale adfærd. På denne måde foreslår vi en sondring mellem lokale mønstre afsløret af opmærksomhed og globale mønstre, der henviser tilbage til input, og analyserer BERT fra begge vinkler. Vi bruger gradient attribution til at analysere, hvordan output af et opmærksomhedshoved afhænger af input tokens, hvilket effektivt udvider den lokale opmærksomhedsbaserede analyse til at tage højde for blandingen af oplysninger i hele transformatorlagene. Vi finder ud af, at der er en betydelig mismatch mellem opmærksomhed og attribution fordeling, forårsaget af blanding af kontekst inde i modellen. Vi kvantificerer denne uoverensstemmelse og observerer, at interessant nok er der nogle mønstre, der fortsætter på tværs af alle lag trods blandingen.', 'nl': 'We kijken dieper naar het gedrag van zelfattentiekoppen in de transformatorarchitectuur. In het licht van recent werk dat het gebruik van aandachtsverdelingen ontmoedigt om het gedrag van een model te verklaren, laten we zien dat aandachtsverdelingen desondanks inzicht kunnen geven in het lokale gedrag van aandachtskoppen. Op deze manier stellen we een onderscheid voor tussen lokale patronen onthuld door aandacht en globale patronen die verwijzen naar de input, en analyseren we BERT vanuit beide hoeken. We gebruiken gradiënt attributie om te analyseren hoe de output van een aandachtskop afhangt van de invoertokens, waardoor de lokale aandacht-gebaseerde analyse effectief wordt uitgebreid om rekening te houden met de vermenging van informatie door de transformatorlagen. We vinden dat er een significante mismatch is tussen aandacht en attributieverdeling, veroorzaakt door de vermenging van context binnen het model. We kwantificeren deze discrepantie en zien dat er interessante patronen zijn die ondanks het mengen over alle lagen blijven bestaan.', 'hr': 'Duboko pogledamo ponašanje samopouzdanja glava u transformacijskoj arhitekturi. S obzirom na nedavni rad koji ometa korištenje raspodjela pažnje za objašnjavanje ponašanja model a, pokazujemo da raspodjela pažnje ipak mogu pružiti uvid u lokalno ponašanje glava pažnje. Ovako predlažemo razliku između lokalnih obrazaca otkrivenih pažnjom i globalnim obrazacima koji se odnose na ulaz i analiziraju BERT iz oba ugla. Koristimo atribuciju gradienta kako bi analizirali kako izlaz glave pažnje zavisi od znakova ulaska, učinkovito proširenje lokalne analize na temelju pažnje da bi se računalo o mješavanju informacija kroz transformacijske slojeve. Nalazimo da postoji značajna nesklada između pažnje i raspodjela privrženja uzrokovana mješanjem konteksta unutar model a. Mi kvantificiramo tu neslaganost i posmatramo da je interesantno, postoje neki obrazac koji nastavljaju preko svih slojeva uprkos miješanju.', 'de': 'Wir werfen einen tiefen Blick auf das Verhalten von Selbstaufmerksamkeitsk繹pfen in der Transformatorarchitektur. Vor dem Hintergrund aktueller Arbeiten, die die Verwendung von Aufmerksamkeitsverteilungen zur Erkl瓣rung des Verhaltens eines Modells entmutigen, zeigen wir, dass Aufmerksamkeitsverteilungen dennoch Einblicke in das lokale Verhalten von Aufmerksamkeitsk繹pfen liefern k繹nnen. Auf diese Weise schlagen wir eine Unterscheidung zwischen lokalen Mustern vor, die durch Aufmerksamkeit aufgedeckt werden, und globalen Mustern, die sich auf den Input beziehen, und analysieren BERT aus beiden Blickwinkeln. Wir verwenden Gradientenattribution, um zu analysieren, wie die Ausgabe eines Aufmerksamkeitskopfes von den Eingangstokens abh瓣ngt, wodurch die lokale aufmerksamkeitsbasierte Analyse effektiv erweitert wird, um die Vermischung von Informationen 羹ber die Transformatorschichten hinweg zu ber羹cksichtigen. Wir stellen fest, dass es eine signifikante Diskrepanz zwischen Aufmerksamkeit und Attributionsverteilungen gibt, die durch die Vermischung von Kontext innerhalb des Modells verursacht wird. Wir quantifizieren diese Diskrepanz und beobachten interessanterweise, dass es einige Muster gibt, die trotz der Mischung 羹ber alle Schichten bestehen bleiben.', 'sw': 'Tunaangalia kwa kina tabia za viongozi wa kujitegemea katika ujenzi wa mabadiliko. Kutokana na shughuli za hivi karibuni zinakera matumizi ya usambazaji wa hisia kwa kuelezea tabia za mifano, tunaonyesha kwamba usambazaji wa hisia unaweza hata hivyo kutoa maoni katika tabia za watu wa mitaa za mwangalizi. Kwa njia hii, tunapendekeza tofauti baina ya mitindo ya maeneo yanayoonyeshwa na mitindo ya kidunia yanayomaanisha tena kwenye kituo hicho, na kuchambua BERT kutoka kwenye anga zote. Tunatumia hisia za kisasa ili uchambuzi jinsi matokeo ya kichwa kinavyotegemea ishara za maandishi, kwa ufanisi mkubwa wa uchambuzi wa kinachosimamia nchini humo kwa ajili ya mchanganyiko wa taarifa katika viwanja vya mabadiliko. Tunakutana kuwa kuna tofauti kubwa kati ya hisia na usambazaji wa mchanganyiko, ulisababishwa na mchanganyiko wa muktadha ndani ya muundo huo. Tunakadiria utofauti huu na kuona kuwa, kwa kutarajiwa, kuna baadhi ya mifano yanayoendelea katika vipande vyote pamoja na mchanganyiko.', 'id': 'We take a deep look into the behaviour of self-attention heads in the transformer architecture.  Karena pekerjaan baru-baru ini menghina penggunaan distribusi perhatian untuk menjelaskan perilaku model, kami menunjukkan bahwa distribusi perhatian bagaimanapun dapat memberikan pengetahuan tentang perilaku lokal kepala perhatian. Dengan cara ini, kita mengusulkan perbedaan antara pola lokal yang diketahui oleh perhatian dan pola global yang merujuk kembali ke input, dan menganalisa BERT dari kedua sudut. Kami menggunakan atribut gradien untuk menganalisis bagaimana output kepala perhatian tergantung pada token input, secara efektif memperluas analisis lokal berdasarkan perhatian untuk memperhitungkan campuran informasi di seluruh lapisan transformer. Kami menemukan bahwa ada ketidakcocokan signifikan antara perhatian dan distribusi atribut, disebabkan oleh campuran konteks di dalam model. Kami mengurangi ketidakcocokan ini dan mengamati bahwa yang menarik, ada beberapa pola yang terus berlangsung di semua lapisan meskipun campuran.', 'tr': "Biz özümiziň ünsli kelleleriniň arhitektura geçirýän davranışyna derin bir seredip görýäris. Ýakyndaky işiň ýakynlaşynda modeliniň davranışyny düşündirmek üçin üns paýlamagyny kesgitmeýäris, biz paýlamagyň üns paýlamagyna seretseňiz ýöne ýerleri kelläň davranışyna pikir edip biler. Bu şekilde, dikkati ve küresel şartlar tarafından gelen yerel şartlar arasında farklılık teklif edip, BERT'i her iki çukurdan çözümlendiriyoruz. Biz seleň çikginiň nähili üns berişi giriş işaretçilerine bağlanýandygyny analyze etmek üçin gradient çe gabdalygyny ullanýarys. Ýerli üns berilýän analyzasyny transformer katlaryň içinde ahyrlaşýar. Biz nusga içindeki kontekst karışmasynyň sebäbi üns we taýýarlama a ýratynyň arasynda wajyp täsirleşmeligini tapýarys. Bu farklılığı ölçüde ve ilginç bir şekilde, karıştırmaya rağmen, her katta süren bazı örnekler vardır.", 'ko': '우리는 트랜스포머 구조에서 자신의 두뇌에 관심을 가지는 행위를 깊이 연구했다.최근의 작업에서 주의 분포를 이용하여 모델의 행위를 해석하는 것을 장려하지 않는 것을 감안하여 주의 분포는 여전히 주의 머리의 국부적인 행위에 대한 통찰을 제공할 수 있음을 나타낸다.이러한 방식을 통해 우리는 제시된 국부 모델과 인용 입력의 전역 모델 간의 차이를 주의하고 이 두 가지 측면에서 BERT를 분석했다.우리는 사다리꼴 귀인을 이용하여 주의 헤드의 출력이 어떻게 입력 표시에 의존하는지 분석하고 국부적인 주의를 바탕으로 하는 분석을 효과적으로 확장하여 전체 전환층의 정보 혼합을 설명한다.우리는 주의와 귀인 분포 사이에 현저한 불일치가 존재하는데 이것은 모델 내부의 언어 환경이 혼합되어 생긴 것이다.우리는 이러한 차이를 계량화하고 흥미로운 것은 혼합이 존재하지만 모든 층에 아직도 일부 모델이 존재한다는 것이다.', 'fa': 'ما یک نگاهی عمیق به رفتار سرهای خودتوجه در معماری تغییر دهنده نگاه می کنیم. با توجه به کار اخیرا که از استفاده از توزیع توجه برای توضیح رفتار یک مدل ناتوان می\u200cشود، نشان می\u200cدهیم که توزیع توجه می\u200cتواند با این حال توجه به رفتار محلی سر توجه کنند. از این طریق، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم فرق بین الگوهای محلی که توسط توجه و الگوهای جهانی نشان داده می\u200cشوند که به ورودی برمی\u200cگردند و BERT را از هر دو زاویه تحلیل می\u200cکنند. ما از انتقال گرادینه استفاده می کنیم تا تحلیل کنیم که چگونه نتیجه سر توجه بر نشانه های ورودی بستگی دارد، با عملی تحلیل توجه بر اساس محلی برای ترکیب اطلاعات در طی لایه های تغییر دهنده بستگی دارد. ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که بین توجه و توزیع انتقال مشکلی وجود دارد، که باعث شده توسط ترکیب محیط داخل مدل است. ما این اختلاف را تعداد می\u200cدهیم و مشاهده می\u200cکنیم که جالب است، برخی از نمونه\u200cهایی وجود دارند که در هر طبقه\u200cای با وجود مخلوط قائل می\u200cشوند.', 'am': 'የመለወጥ አካውንት ውስጥ የራሳችን አካሄድ ጥልቅ ተመልከት እናደርጋለን፡፡ የአሁኑ ሥራ የሞዴል ሥርዓት ለመግለጽ ጥያቄዎችን ለመጠቀም በመጠየቅ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ This way, we propose a distinction between local patterns revealed by attention and global patterns that refer back to the input, and analyze BERT from both angles.  የጥያቄ አካባቢ የራስ ውጤት በምን ላይ እንደሚታመነ እናስተምር ዘንድ፣ የአገር መረጃውን በመጠቀም በአካባቢው ላይ ለመጠቀም እናስጠጋለን፡፡ በሞዴል ውስጥ ግንኙነት በመጠቀም እና በአካባቢነት መካከል ታላቅ ስህተት እንዳለ እናገኘዋለን፡፡ ይህንን ቅንነትን እናሳውቃለን፣ በአጠቃሚ እንደሆነ፣ ምንም እንኳ በመቀላቀል እንኳ በአገር ሁሉ ላይ የሚኖሩ ምሳሌዎች አሉ፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք խորապես ուսումնասիրում ենք ինքնաուշադրության գլխավորների վարքը վերափոխողի ճարտարապետության մեջ: Վերջերս կատարված աշխատանքի շնորհիվ, որը խրախուսում է ուշադրության տարածումների օգտագործումը մոդելի վարքագիծը բացատրելու համար, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ուշադրության տարածումները միևնույն է կարող են ներկայացնել ուշադրության գլխավորների տեղական վարքագիծը: Այսպես, մենք առաջարկում ենք տարբերություն տեղական կաղապարների միջև, որը հայտնաբերվում է ուշադրության և գլոբալ կաղապարների միջև, որոնք վերադառնում են ներմուծին և վերլուծում են BER-ը երկու անկյունից: We use gradient attribution to analyze how the output of an attention head depends on the input tokens, effectively extending the local attention-based analysis to account for the mixing of information throughout the transformer layers.  Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ ուշադրության և պատասխանատվության տարածումների միջև մեծ անհամապատասխանություն կա, որը առաջացել է մոդելի ներսում գտնվող կոնտեքստի խառնման պատճառով: Մենք չափեցնում ենք այս անհամապատասխանությունը և հետաքրքիր է, որ կան որոշ կաղապարներ, որոնք շարունակվում են բոլոր շերտերում, չնայած խառնման:', 'sq': 'Ne hedhim një sy të thellë në sjelljen e kokave të vetëvëmendjes në arkitekturën e transformuesit. Në dritën e punës s ë fundit që zhgënjen përdorimin e shpërndarjeve të vëmendjes për shpjegimin e sjelljes së një modeli, ne tregojmë se shpërndarjet e vëmendjes megjithatë mund të ofrojnë kuptime në sjelljen lokale të kokave të vëmendjes. Kështu, ne propozojmë një dallim midis modeleve lokale të zbuluar nga vëmendja dhe modelet globale që referohen prapa tek input dhe analizojnë BERT nga të dy këndët. Ne përdorim atribucionin e gradientit për të analizuar se si dalja e një koke vëmendjeje varet nga shenjat e hyrjes, duke zgjeruar efektivisht analizën lokale të bazuar në vëmendje për të llogaritur përzierjen e informacionit në të gjithë shtresat e transformuesit. Ne zbulojmë se ka një mospërputhje të rëndësishme midis vëmendjes dhe shpërndarjeve të atribucionit, të shkaktuar nga përzierja e kontekstit brenda modelit. We quantify this discrepancy and observe that interestingly, there are some patterns that persist across all layers despite the mixing.', 'bn': 'আমরা নিজেদের মনোযোগ আচরণের গভীর দিকে তাকিয়ে দেখছি পরিবর্তনের স্থাপত্যের কারণে। সাম্প্রতিক কাজের আলোকে মডেলের আচরণ ব্যাখ্যা করার জন্য মনোযোগ ব্যবহারের ব্যবহার ব্যাপারে দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিতে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে মনোযোগ বিতরণ স্থা এই ভাবে, আমরা স্থানীয় প্যানেটের মধ্যে একটি বিচ্ছিন্ন প্রস্তাব করছি যা মনোযোগ দিয়ে প্রকাশিত এবং বিশ্বব্যাপী প্যানারের মাধ্যমে প্ আমরা গ্রেডিয়ান অ্যাট্রিবিউশন ব্যবহার করি বিশ্লেষণ করার জন্য যে কিভাবে মনোযোগ আউটপুটের প্রতি নির্ভর করে, কার্যকর ভাবে স্থানীয় মনোযোগ বিশ্লেষণ ব আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে মনোযোগ এবং বিতরণ বিতরণের মধ্যে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভুল মিল রয়েছে, যার ফলে মডেলের ভিতরে প্রসঙ্গের মিশ্রণে We quantify this discrepancy and observe that interestingly, there are some patterns that persist across all layers despite the mixing.', 'af': "Ons neem 'n diep kyk in die gedrag van self-aandagkoppe in die transformeerder-arkitektuur. In die lig van onlangse werk wat die gebruik van aandag verspreidings onthou om 'n model se gedrag te verduidelik, wys ons dat aandag verspreidings tog inligting in die plaaslike gedrag van aandagkoppe kan verskaf. Hierdie manier voorstel ons 'n verskil tussen plaaslike patrone wat deur aandag en globaal patrone vertel wat terug na die invoer verwys en BERT van beide hoeke analiseer. Ons gebruik GradiÃ«nt toewysing om te analiseer hoe die uitvoer van 'n aandagkop afhang van die invoer tekens, effektief uitbrei die plaaslike aandag-gebaseerde analiseer na rekening vir die gemeenskap van inligting deur die transformer lagte. Ons vind dat daar 'n betekende misooreenstemming tussen aandag en verspreidings, veroorsaak deur die gemeenskap van konteks binne in die model. Ons quantifiseer hierdie skielikheid en aanhou dat interessant is, daar is sommige patrone wat oor alle laagte persister, verag die gemeenskap.", 'ca': "Fem una ullada profunda al comportament dels cabells d'auto-atenció de l'arquitectura transformadora. A la llum de la feina recent que desafavoreix l'ús de distribucions d'atenció per explicar el comportament d'un model, demostram que les distribucions d'atenció poden donar insights sobre el comportament local dels cabells d'atenció. This way, we propose a distinction between local patterns revealed by attention and global patterns that refer back to the input, and analyze BERT from both angles.  Utilitzem l'atribució de gradient per analitzar com la producció d'un cap d'atenció depèn de les fitxes d'entrada, ampliant efectivament l'an àlisi basat en l'atenció local per explicar la combinació d'informació a través de les capes de transformador. Trobem que hi ha un desequilibri significatiu entre les distribucions d'atenció i d'atribució, causat per la combinació de context dins el model. Quantifiquem aquesta discrepancia i observem que, curiosament, hi ha alguns patrons que persisten en totes les capes malgrat la mistura.", 'az': "Biz özümüzün dikkatini dəyişən arhitektəqlərin davranışına baxırıq. Əvvəlki işin aydınlığında modelinin davranışlarını a çıq-aydınlaşdırmaq üçün dikkati dağıtmaq üçün təsirlərin istifadəsini dəyişdirməyi müdafiə edirik. Beləliklə, dikkati və qlobal modellərlə göstərilən yerli modellərin arasındakı fərqliyi təbliğ edirik və BERT'i iki çöpdən analiz edirik. Biz səhifənin çıxışını növbənöv giriş işarələrinə bağlı kimi analiz etmək üçün səhifəni istifadə edirik, yerli təsirli analizi transformer səhifələrində məlumatların karışmasını hesablamaq üçün uzaqlaşdırırıq. Biz modellərin içində məlumat karışmasından səbəb olan məlumat və təsirlərin arasında möhkəm bir ayrılıq var. Biz bu fərqliyi kvantitatlıq edir və gözləyirik ki, bu fərqliyə qarışmağa rağmen, hər bir fərqli səviyyədə möhkəm duran bəzi modellər var.", 'fi': 'Tutkimme syvällisesti itsetunnon päiden käyttäytymistä muuntajan arkkitehtuurissa. Kun otetaan huomioon viimeaikainen työ, jossa huomiojakauman käyttö mallin käyttäytymisen selittämisessä on estetty, osoitamme, että huomiojakauma voi kuitenkin antaa tietoa huomiopäiden paikallisesta käyttäytymisestä. Tällä tavoin ehdotamme erottelua huomiosta paljastuneiden paikallisten kuvioiden ja panokseen viittaavien maailmanlaajuisten kuvioiden välillä ja analysoimme BERT:tä molemmista näkökulmista. Käytämme gradientti-attribuutiota analysoidaksemme, miten huomiopään tuotos riippuu tulopoleteista, laajentaen tehokkaasti paikallista huomiopohjaista analyysiä ottamaan huomioon tiedon sekoittumisen muuntajakerroksissa. Havaitsemme, että huomio- ja attribuutiojakaumien välillä on merkittävä epäsuhta, joka johtuu kontekstin sekoittumisesta mallin sisällä. Määritämme tämän poikkeaman määrällisesti ja huomaamme, että on mielenkiintoista, että jotkut kuviot pysyvät kaikissa kerroksissa sekoituksesta huolimatta.', 'bs': 'Duboko pogledamo ponašanje glava samopouzdanja u transformacijskoj arhitekturi. S obzirom na nedavni rad koji ometa korištenje raspodjela pažnje za objašnjavanje ponašanja model a, pokazujemo da raspodjela pažnje ipak mogu pružiti uvid u lokalno ponašanje glava pažnje. Ovako predlažemo razliku između lokalnih obrazaca otkrivenih pažnjom i globalnim obrazacima koji se odnose na ulaz i analiziraju BERT iz oba ugla. Koristimo atribuciju gradienta kako bi analizirali kako izlaz glave pažnje zavisi od znakova ulaska, učinkovito proširenje lokalne analize na temelju pažnje da bi se računalo o miješanju informacija kroz transformacijske slojeve. Nalazimo da postoji značajna nesklada između pažnje i raspodjela privrženja uzrokovana mješanjem konteksta unutar model a. Mi kvantificiramo ovu neslaganost i posmatramo da je interesantno, postoje neki obrazac koji nastavljaju preko svih slojeva uprkos miješanju.', 'cs': 'Hluboko se zabýváme chováním hlav sebepozornosti v architektuře transformátoru. Na základě nedávné práce odrazující využití distribucí pozornosti pro vysvětlení chování modelu ukazujeme, že distribuce pozornosti však mohou poskytnout pohled na lokální chování hlav pozornosti. Tímto způsobem navrhujeme rozlišení mezi lokálními vzorci odhalenými pozorností a globálními vzorci, které odkazují na vstup, a analyzujeme BERT z obou úhlů. Pomocí atribuce gradientů analyzujeme, jak závisí výstup hlavy pozornosti na vstupních tokenech, čímž efektivně rozšiřujeme lokální analýzu založenou na pozornosti, aby zohlednila míchání informací napříč transformátorovými vrstvami. Zjišťujeme, že existuje významná nesoulada mezi distribucemi pozornosti a atribucí, způsobená mícháním kontextu uvnitř modelu. Kvantifikujeme tuto nesrovnalost a pozorujeme, že je zajímavé, že existují některé vzory, které přetrvávají napříč všemi vrstvami navzdory smíchání.', 'et': 'Me uurime sügavalt enesetähelepanu peade käitumist transformaatori arhitektuuris. Hiljutiste tööde valguses, mis takistavad tähelepanu jaotuste kasutamist mudeli käitumise selgitamiseks, näitame, et tähelepanu jaotus võib siiski anda ülevaate tähelepanu peade kohalikust käitumisest. Sel viisil teeme ettepaneku eristada tähelepanu poolt ilmnevaid kohalikke mustreid ja sisendile viitavaid globaalseid mustreid ning analüüsida BERT-i mõlemast nurgast. Kasutame gradientide omistamist, et analüüsida, kuidas tähelepanu pea väljund sõltub sisendmärkidest, laiendades tõhusalt kohalikku tähelepanu põhinevat analüüsi, et arvestada teabe segamist trafokihtides. Leiame, et tähelepanu- ja atribuudijaotuste vahel on märkimisväärne ebakõla, mille põhjuseks on konteksti segamine mudelis. Me kvantifitseerime seda lahknevust ja täheldame, et huvitaval kombel on mõned mustrid, mis püsivad kõigis kihtides hoolimata segunemisest.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntukne gedung winih kanggo urêp nggawe gerakan oleh dumadhi iki ning arêtati sing itoleh. Genjer Digawso, nggunakake ngilanggar sampeyang dipun wae dipun wae dipun Where Awak dhéwé ngerasakno ora ono nggawe diunting nggawe aturan karo Distribusi buturang nggawe Awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe gerakan diolah iki lan ngelarang iki luwih apik, kaya pernik saiki ditumpa sing koyok ngono kuwi tindakan kanggo ngilangno.', 'sk': 'Globoko si ogledamo vedenje samopozornih glav v transformatorski arhitekturi. V luči nedavnih del, ki odvračajo od uporabe porazdelitve pozornosti za pojasnjevanje vedenja modela, pokažemo, da porazdelitve pozornosti kljub temu omogočajo vpogled v lokalno vedenje glav pozornosti. Na ta način predlagamo razlikovanje med lokalnimi vzorci, ki jih razkriva pozornost, in globalnimi vzorci, ki se nanašajo nazaj na vnos, ter analiziramo BERT iz obeh zornih kotov. Pripisovanje gradientov uporabljamo za analizo, kako je izhod glave pozornosti odvisen od vhodnih žetonov, s čimer učinkovito razširimo lokalno analizo na osnovi pozornosti, da upoštevamo mešanje informacij v plasteh transformatorjev. Ugotavljamo, da obstaja veliko neskladje med porazdelitvami pozornosti in dodeljevanja, ki ga povzroča mešanje konteksta znotraj modela. To razliko kvantificiramo in opazimo, da je zanimivo, da obstajajo nekateri vzorci, ki kljub mešanju obstajajo v vseh plasteh.', 'he': 'אנחנו מסתכלים עמוק בתנהגות ראשי תשומת לב עצמית בארכיטקטורת המעבר. בהתחשב בעבודה האחרונה שמניחה את השימוש בתפיצות תשומת לב להסביר התנהגות של מודל, אנו מראים שמפיצות תשומת לב בכל מקרה יכולות לספק תובנות לתנהגות מקומית של ראשי תשומת לב. בדרך זו, אנו מציעים הבדל בין דפוסים מקומיים שנחשפו על ידי תשומת לב ודפוסים גלובליים שמתקשרים חזרה לתכנית, ונבחן BERT משני הזוויות. אנו משתמשים באישורי התדרגות כדי לנתח איך יציאה של ראש תשומת לב תלויה על סימני הכניסה, בהיעיל האפשרות להאריך את הנתח המבוסס על תשומת לב המקומי כדי לחשבון על הערבוב של מידע בכל שכבות המעבר. אנו מוצאים שיש אי-התאמה משמעותית בין תשומת לב לתפיצות התפיצות, שנגרמה ע"י הערבוב של הקשר בתוך המודל. אנו מכוונים את ההפרעה הזו ונצפה שמעניין, יש כמה דפוסים שמשתמשים בכל השכבות למרות הערבוב.', 'ha': "Muna dũba zuwa ga aikin masu jiɓinta kanka a cikin muhimman mai musanya. Daga haske da aikin na farko ya kuɓutar da amfani da rabon muhimu dõmin ya bayyana aikin wani misali, Munã nũna wa rabon nau'i, kuma amma, gauraya masu fassarar muhimmi za'a iya ba da gannai a cikin aikin muhimmada na danganta. Kamar wannan, Munã goyyar da rarrabẽwa a tsakanin shiryoyin lokal da aka nuna da shiryarwa da shiryoyin abubuwa masu bincike da ke gaya zuwa inputan, kuma Mu yi anaƙayyade BERT daga duk takarda. Munã yi amfani da hissarwa na girmar, dõmin Mu yi anaƙaita yadda Outputin wani nau'i zai dõgara a kan ayõyin inputi, kuma Mu shimfiɗa anaƙalumin wanda ke cikin aikin aiki da zai yi amfani da shi kafin da ya haɗa zane-zane cikin zanen transformation. Tuna gane cewa there akwai wani abu mai girma a tsakanin bincike da rabon zane-rabon, wanda aka samu da haɗi da mazaɓa cikin misalin. We quantify this discrepancy and observe that interestingly, there are some patterns that persist across all layers despite the mixing.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡུལ་འདྲ་བཟོ་བྱེད་པའི་སྒེར་གྱི་བྱ་སྟངས་ལ་ཟབ་པོ་ཞིག ཉེ་ཆར་བ་ཅིག་གི་བཟོ་བར་བྱ་རྗེས་སུ་གནད་དོན་པའི་བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་མ་མཐུན་པས་ང་ཚོས་དཔེ་དབུལ་རྗེས་སུ་གཏོང་བ་དང་། འདི་ལྟར། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཁུལ་གྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་དང་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་ཆོས་ཉིད་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་པར་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དང་། དབྱ We use gradient attribution to analyze how the output of an attention head depends on the input tokens, effectively extending the local attention-based analysis to account for the mixing of information throughout the transformer layers. ང་ཚོར་མཐོང་ན། གནད་དོན་དང་ཁྱད་ཆོས་དབྱིབས་བཤད་རྩལ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་མི་མཐུན་པ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ་རྐྱེན་འདུག ང་ཚོས་ཁྱད་པར་ཚད་ལྡན་དང་མཐོང་ནི་བརྗོད་མཁན་ཡོད་པའི་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཅིག་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Maximal Multiverse Learning for Promoting Cross-Task Generalization of Fine-Tuned Language Models', 'pt': 'Aprendizado Multiverso Máximo para Promover a Generalização de Tarefas Cruzadas de Modelos de Linguagem Afinados', 'es': 'Maximal Multiverse Learning para promover la generalización entre tareas de modelos lingüísticos ajustados', 'fr': 'Apprentissage multivers maximal pour favoriser la généralisation multitâche de modèles linguistiques affinés', 'ar': 'أقصى قدر من التعلم للكون المتعدد لتعزيز تعميم المهام المتقاطعة لنماذج اللغة الدقيقة', 'zh': '趣进微言模样,大概多元宇宙学', 'ja': '微調整言語モデルのクロスタスクの一般化を促進するための最大の多元宇宙学習', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-टास्क सामान्यीकरण को बढ़ावा देने के लिए अधिकतम मल्टीवर्स लर्निंग ठीक-ट्यून किए गए भाषा मॉडल', 'ru': 'Максимальное многовариантное обучение для содействия кросс-задачному обобщению тонко настроенных языковых моделей', 'ga': 'Uasmhéid Foghlama Ilghnéitheach chun Ginearálú Tras-Tasc ar Mhúnlaí Teanga Mionchoigeartaithe a Chur Chun Cinn', 'ka': 'მაქსიმალური მრავალური სწავლობა ძირითადი სიტყვალური მოდელეების განმავლობაში', 'hu': 'Maximális többverses tanulás a finomhangolt nyelvi modellek többfunkciós általánosításának előmozdításához', 'el': 'Μέγιστη Πολυμερής Μάθηση για την προώθηση της γενικοποίησης των εκλεπτυσμένων γλωσσικών μοντέλων', 'it': 'Massima apprendimento multiverso per promuovere la generalizzazione cross-task di modelli linguistici perfezionati', 'kk': 'Қосымша тапсырмалар тіл үлгілерін жасау үшін көптеген көптеген үйрену', 'lt': 'Didžiausias daugialypis mokymasis, skirtas tobulintų kalbų modelių tarpuždavinių generalizacijos skatinimui', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran Multiverse Maksimum untuk Mempromosikan Jeneralisasi Tugas Salib Model Bahasa Tertunjukan Terbaik', 'mk': 'Name', 'mn': 'Хамгийн их олон хэлбэрийн суралцах нь олон дасгал дасгал дасгал хэл загваруудыг нэмэгдүүлэхийн тулд', 'mt': 'Tagħlim Multiversali Massimu għall-Promozzjoni tal-Ġeneralizzazzjoni ta’ Ħidmiet Cross-Task ta’ Mudelli Lingwistiċi Mhux Irfinati', 'no': 'Maksimal multiverselæring for å forstørra kryss- oppgåver generering av finnstillingsspråk- modeller', 'pl': 'Maksymalne uczenie się wielowarstwowe dla promowania ogólnej generalizacji dostosowanych modeli językowych', 'ro': 'Învățare multiversă maximă pentru promovarea generalizării cross-task a modelelor lingvistice reglate fin', 'sr': 'Maksimalno većinsko učenje za unapređenje generalizacije prekršnih zadataka modela finog jezika', 'si': 'විශිෂ්ට භාෂාව ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා විශිෂ්ට විශිෂ්ට විශිෂ්ට විශිෂ්ට විශිෂ්ට විශිෂ්ට', 'so': 'Waxbarashada luuqadaha Fine-Tuned', 'sv': 'Maximalt multivers lärande för att främja övergripande generalisering av finjusterade språkmodeller', 'ta': 'கிராஸ்- பணி பொதுவாக்கத்திற்கான அதிகபட்ச மொழி மொழி மாதிரிகளுக்கான கற்றுக்கொடுக்கிறது', 'ur': 'فائن-ٹونڈ زبان موڈل کی پیدائش کرنے کے لئے بہت زیادہ مختلف تعلیم', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്- ടാസ്ക് ജെനറലേഷന്\u200d പ്രോഗ്രേഷന്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള ഏറ്റവും കൂടുതല്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നു', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học nhiều vũ trụ tối đa để phát triển nhiều quy trình ngôn ngữ', 'hr': 'Maksimalno multiversalno učenje za promicanje generalizacije krstozadataka modela finog razmjerenog jezika', 'nl': 'Maximaal multiversum leren voor het bevorderen van cross-task generalisatie van verfijnde taalmodellen', 'da': 'Maksimal multivers læring til fremme af cross-task generalisering af finjusterede sprogmodeller', 'bg': 'Максимално многоверсално обучение за насърчаване на генерирането на различни задачи на фино настроени езикови модели', 'id': 'Maximal Multiverse Learning for Promoting Cross-Task Generalization of Fine-Tuned Language Models', 'ko': '최대 다원 우주 학습은 마이크로 언어 모델의 크로스 퀘스트 범화를 촉진한다', 'de': 'Maximales Mehrfachlernen zur Förderung der aufgabenübergreifenden Generalisierung fein abgestimmter Sprachmodelle', 'fa': 'بزرگترین یادگیری Multiverse برای توسعه تولید مدل\u200cهای زبان تنظیم شده', 'sw': 'Makubwa zaidi ya Kufundisha kwa ajili ya Kuhamasisha Umoja wa Mitandao ya Lugha yenye Tamko', 'sq': 'Mësimi Maksimal Multiverse për nxitjen e gjeneralizimit të punëve të ndërsjellta të modeleve të gjuhës së tunduar mirë', 'tr': 'Çapraz-Taýry Düzenlemek üçin Ullanyş Çokluversel Öwrenmek', 'az': 'İyi-ayarlanmış Dil Modellərini təşkil etmək üçün ən böyük Multiverse Öyrənmək', 'hy': 'Maximal Multiverse Learning for Promoting Cross-Task Generalization of Fine-Tuned Language Models', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bn': 'সুন্দর ভাষা মোডেলের জন্য ক্রস- কাজের সাধারণ শিক্ষা', 'ca': "L'aprenentatge multiversal màxim per promoure la generalització de models de llenguatge ben adaptats", 'cs': 'Maximální multiveršní učení pro podporu cross-task generalizace jemně laděných jazykových modelů', 'et': 'Maksimaalne mitmevärsne õpe peenestatud keelemudelite ülesannetevahelise generaliseerimise edendamiseks', 'fi': 'Maksimaalinen moniosainen oppiminen hienoviritettyjen kielimallien ristikkäisten tehtävien yleistämisen edistämiseksi', 'af': 'Maksimum Multiverse Leer vir Promoting Kruis- taak Generalisasie van Fine- Tuned Taal Models', 'bs': 'Maksimalno multiversalno učenje za unapređenje generalizacije preko zadataka modela finog jezika', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Maksimalno večvrstno učenje za spodbujanje mednaložne generalizacije finih jezikovnih modelov', 'bo': 'Maximal Multiverse Learning for Promoting Cross-Task Generalization of Fine-Tuned Language Models', 'jv': 'Learn Mode', 'he': 'למידה מרובה מקסימלית כדי לקדם הגנרליזציה של משימות צלבות של מודלים שפות מתאימים'}
{'en': 'Language modeling with BERT consists of two phases of (i) unsupervised pre-training on unlabeled text, and (ii) fine-tuning for a specific supervised task. We present a method that leverages the second phase to its fullest, by applying an extensive number of parallel classifier heads, which are enforced to be orthogonal, while adaptively eliminating the weaker heads during training. We conduct an extensive inter- and intra-dataset evaluation, showing that our method improves the generalization ability of BERT, sometimes leading to a +9 % gain in accuracy. These results highlight the importance of a proper fine-tuning procedure, especially for relatively smaller-sized datasets. Our code is attached as supplementary.', 'fr': "La modélisation linguistique avec BERT comprend deux phases\xa0: (i) une formation préalable non supervisée sur du texte non étiqueté, et (ii) une mise au point pour une tâche supervisée spécifique. Nous présentons une méthode qui tire le meilleur parti de la deuxième phase, en appliquant un grand nombre de têtes de classement parallèles, qui sont forcées pour être orthogonales, tout en éliminant de manière adaptative les têtes les plus faibles pendant l'entraînement. Nous effectuons une évaluation approfondie inter et intra-jeu de données, montrant que notre méthode améliore la capacité de généralisation du BERT, conduisant parfois à un gain de précision de +9\xa0%. Ces résultats mettent en évidence l'importance d'une procédure de réglage fin appropriée, en particulier pour les ensembles de données de taille relativement réduite. Notre code est joint en tant que supplément.", 'ar': 'تتكون نمذجة اللغة باستخدام BERT من مرحلتين من (1) التدريب المسبق غير الخاضع للإشراف على النص غير المصنف ، و (2) الضبط الدقيق لمهمة محددة خاضعة للإشراف. نقدم طريقة تعزز المرحلة الثانية إلى أقصى حد ، من خلال تطبيق عدد كبير من رؤوس المصنفات المتوازية ، والتي يتم فرضها لتكون متعامدة ، بينما تقضي بشكل تكيفي على الرؤوس الأضعف أثناء التدريب. نجري تقييمًا شاملًا بين مجموعة البيانات وداخلها ، يوضح أن طريقتنا تعمل على تحسين قدرة التعميم لـ BERT ، مما يؤدي أحيانًا إلى زيادة الدقة بنسبة 9٪. تسلط هذه النتائج الضوء على أهمية إجراء الضبط المناسب ، خاصة لمجموعات البيانات الأصغر نسبيًا. رمزنا مرفق كمكمل.', 'pt': 'A modelagem de linguagem com BERT consiste em duas fases de (i) pré-treinamento não supervisionado em texto não rotulado e (ii) ajuste fino para uma tarefa supervisionada específica. Apresentamos um método que aproveita ao máximo a segunda fase, aplicando um grande número de cabeças classificadoras paralelas, que são forçadas a serem ortogonais, eliminando adaptativamente as cabeças mais fracas durante o treinamento. Conduzimos uma extensa avaliação inter e intra-conjunto de dados, mostrando que nosso método melhora a capacidade de generalização do BERT, às vezes levando a um ganho de +9% na precisão. Esses resultados destacam a importância de um procedimento de ajuste fino adequado, especialmente para conjuntos de dados de tamanho relativamente menor. Nosso código está anexado como complementar.', 'es': 'El modelado del lenguaje con BERT consiste en dos fases de (i) preentrenamiento no supervisado sobre texto sin etiqueta y (ii) ajuste para una tarea supervisada específica. Presentamos un método que aprovecha la segunda fase al máximo, mediante la aplicación de un gran número de cabezales clasificadores paralelos, que se obligan a ser ortogonales, al tiempo que se eliminan de forma adaptativa los cabezales más débiles durante el entrenamiento. Llevamos a cabo una amplia evaluación inter e intra-conjunto de datos, que demuestra que nuestro método mejora la capacidad de generalización de BERT, lo que a veces conduce a una ganancia de precisión de +9%. Estos resultados destacan la importancia de un procedimiento de ajuste adecuado, especialmente para conjuntos de datos de tamaño relativamente más pequeño. Nuestro código se adjunta como complemento.', 'ja': 'BERTを使用した言語モデリングは、(i)ラベル付けされていないテキストに関する監督なしの事前トレーニング、および(ii)特定の監督されたタスクのための微調整の2つのフェーズで構成されています。トレーニング中に弱いヘッドを適応的に排除しながら、直交するように強制される多数の並列分類ヘッドを適用することにより、第２のフェーズを最大限に活用する方法を提示する。データセット間およびデータセット内での広範な評価を行い、当社の方法がBERTの一般化能力を向上させ、時には精度の+9%の向上につながることを示しています。これらの結果は、特に比較的小さなサイズのデータセットにとって、適切な微調整手順の重要性を強調しています。当社のコードは補足として添付されています。', 'zh': '用BERT言建模二:(i)无监督之预训练,及(ii)特定督之微。 建一用第二阶段之法,大并其类器头强制为正交,而自适其弱者也。 博数集间数集内评,明吾道增BERT之泛化能,或致准确性+9%。 此其要,特于对小之数集也。 臣等代码为补附后。', 'ru': 'Языковое моделирование с BERT состоит из двух этапов: (i) неконтролируемое предварительное обучение на немеченом тексте и (ii) точная настройка для конкретной контролируемой задачи. Предложен метод, который максимально использует вторую фазу, применяя большое количество параллельных головок классификатора, которые принудительно становятся ортогональными, при этом адаптивно устраняя более слабые головы во время обучения. Мы проводим обширную оценку между и внутри набора данных, показывая, что наш метод улучшает способность обобщения BERT, иногда приводя к увеличению точности на +9%. Эти результаты подчеркивают важность надлежащей процедуры доработки, особенно для относительно небольших наборов данных. Наш код прилагается в качестве дополнения.', 'hi': 'BERT के साथ भाषा मॉडलिंग में (i) अनलेबल पाठ पर असुरक्षित पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण के दो चरण होते हैं, और (ii) एक विशिष्ट पर्यवेक्षित कार्य के लिए ठीक-ट्यूनिंग। हम एक ऐसी विधि प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो दूसरे चरण को पूरी तरह से लाभ उठाती है, समानांतर क्लासिफायर सिर की एक विस्तृत संख्या को लागू करके, जिसे ऑर्थोगोनल होने के लिए लागू किया जाता है, जबकि प्रशिक्षण के दौरान कमजोर सिर को अनुकूलित रूप से समाप्त कर दिया जाता है। हम एक व्यापक अंतर- और इंट्रा-डेटासेट मूल्यांकन का संचालन करते हैं, यह दिखाते हुए कि हमारी विधि BERT की सामान्यीकरण क्षमता में सुधार करती है, कभी-कभी सटीकता में +9% लाभ के लिए अग्रणी होती है। ये परिणाम एक उचित ठीक-ट्यूनिंग प्रक्रिया के महत्व को उजागर करते हैं, विशेष रूप से अपेक्षाकृत छोटे आकार के डेटासेट के लिए। हमारा कोड अनुपूरक के रूप में संलग्न है।', 'ga': 'Tá dhá chéim i samhaltú teanga le CRET (i) réamhoiliúint gan mhaoirseacht ar théacs gan lipéad, agus (ii) mionchoigeartú do thasc faoi leith faoi mhaoirseacht. Cuirimid i láthair modh a ghiaráil an dara céim chomh fada agus is féidir, trí líon fairsing de chinn aicmitheora comhthreomhara a chur i bhfeidhm, a chuirtear i bhfeidhm go orthogonal, agus ag an am céanna deireadh a chur leis na cinnirí níos laige le linn na hoiliúna. Déanaimid meastóireacht fhairsing idir agus laistigh den tacar sonraí, a thaispeánann go bhfeabhsaítear ár modh cumas ginearálaithe BERT, rud a fhágann go dtiocfaidh méadú +9% ar chruinneas uaireanta. Leagann na torthaí seo béim ar a thábhachtaí atá nós imeachta ceart mionchoigeartaithe, go háirithe maidir le tacair shonraí atá sách beag. Tá ár gcód ceangailte mar fhorlíontach.', 'ka': 'BERT-ის ენის მოდელირება consists of two phases of i) unpupervised pre-training on untabeled text, and (ii) fine-tuning for a specific supervised task. ჩვენ მივიღეთ მეტი, რომელიც მეორე ფეზის უკეთესი ფაზისთვის, რომელიც პერალელური კლასიფიკაციური თავის უფრო დიდი რაოდენობა, რომელიც უფრო დიდი კლასიფიკაციური თავის, რომელიც იქნება ორტოდონალურ ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ განსაზღვრებული ინტერე- და ინტერე- დეტატისტეტის განსაზღვრება, რომელიც ჩვენი მეთოდი უფრო მეტადებს BERT-ის გენერალიზაციის შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც ზუსტად +9% მოი ამ შედეგის შესახებ მარტივი კონფიგურაციის პროცესტის მნიშვნელობა, განსაკუთრებით პარამეტად მარტივი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციისთვის. ნაქთჲრ კჲე ვ ოპთეყლზვნ კარჲ ეჲოლსმვნრვლვნ.', 'hu': 'A BERT-vel végzett nyelvmodellezés két fázisából áll: i. felügyelet nélküli előképzés a címke nélküli szövegről, és ii. finomhangolás egy adott felügyelt feladathoz. Bemutatunk egy olyan módszert, amely a második fázisot a lehető legteljesebb mértékben kihasználja, széles számú párhuzamos osztályozófej alkalmazásával, amelyeket ortogonálisnak kényszerítenek, miközben adaptívan kiküszöböli a gyengébb fejeket edzés közben. Széleskörű adatközi és adatkészleten belüli értékelést végzünk, amely kimutatja, hogy módszerünk javítja a BERT általánosítási képességét, néha +9%-os pontosságnövekedést eredményez. Ezek az eredmények kiemelik a megfelelő finomhangolási eljárás fontosságát, különösen a viszonylag kisebb méretű adatkészletek esetében. A kódunkat kiegészítőként csatolták.', 'el': 'Η γλωσσική μοντελοποίηση με το BERT αποτελείται από δύο φάσεις: (i) χωρίς επίβλεψη προεκπαίδευσης σε κείμενο χωρίς επισήμανση και (ii) τελειοποίησης για μια συγκεκριμένη εποπτευόμενη εργασία. Παρουσιάζουμε μια μέθοδο που αξιοποιεί στο έπακρο τη δεύτερη φάση, εφαρμόζοντας έναν εκτεταμένο αριθμό παράλληλων κεφαλών ταξινομητών, οι οποίες επιβάλλονται να είναι ορθογώνιες, ενώ εξαλείφονται προσαρμοστικά τα ασθενέστερα κεφάλια κατά τη διάρκεια της προπόνησης. Διεξάγουμε μια εκτενή αξιολόγηση μεταξύ και εντός συνόλου δεδομένων, δείχνοντας ότι η μέθοδος μας βελτιώνει την ικανότητα γενικοποίησης του ΒΡΤ, οδηγώντας μερικές φορές σε +9% κέρδος στην ακρίβεια. Τα αποτελέσματα αυτά υπογραμμίζουν τη σημασία μιας σωστής διαδικασίας συντονισμού, ειδικά για σχετικά μικρότερα σύνολα δεδομένων. Ο κώδικας μας επισυνάπτεται ως συμπληρωματικός.', 'it': "La modellazione linguistica con BERT consiste in due fasi di (i) formazione pre-supervisionata su testo non etichettato e (ii) messa a punto per uno specifico compito supervisionato. Presentiamo un metodo che sfrutta al massimo la seconda fase, applicando un ampio numero di teste di classificazione parallele, che vengono imposte per essere ortogonali, eliminando in modo adattivo le teste più deboli durante l'allenamento. Conduciamo un'ampia valutazione inter- e intra-dataset, dimostrando che il nostro metodo migliora la capacità di generalizzazione di BERT, portando a volte a un aumento di precisione del +9%. Questi risultati evidenziano l'importanza di una corretta procedura di messa a punto, soprattutto per set di dati di dimensioni relativamente ridotte. Il nostro codice è allegato come supplemento.", 'kk': 'BERT тілдерді моделдеу үшін келтірілмеген мәтін арқылы (i) алдын- алдын- алдын- алдын- алдын- алдын- алдын- алдын- алдын- алдын- алдын- алдын- ала (ii) келтірілген тапсырма үші Біз екінші этапды толығына көмектесетін әдісін көрсету әдісін көрсетедік. Бұл параллел классификациялық басының көбекті санын қолдануға болады. Бұл ортогоналық болып, оқыту кезінде бақытты басының к Біз деректер қорының интернет және интернет қорының тең бағалауын жасаймыз. Біздің әдіміздің BERT жалпы түрлендіру мүмкіндігін жақсартып, кейбірде +9% дегенді дұрыс етеді. Бұл нәтижелер дұрыс баптау процедурының маңыздылығын белгілеп береді, әсіресе салыстырып кішірейтін деректер жиындарының маңыздылығын белгілейді. Біздің кодіміз қосымша ретінде тіркелген.', 'lt': 'Language modeling with BERT consists of two phases of (i) unsupervised pre-training on unlabeled text, and (ii) fine-tuning for a specific supervised task.  Pateikiame metodą, kuris visiškai sutelkia antrąjį etapą taikant platų lygiagrečių klasifikatorių galvų skaičių, kurie yra priversti būti ortogonali, kartu adaptyviai pašalinant silpnesnes galvas mokymo metu. Atliekame išsamų duomenų rinkinių tarpusavio ir vidaus vertinimą, parodantį, kad mūsų metodas pagerina BERT generalizacijos gebėjimą, kartais didinant tikslumą +9 %. Šie rezultatai pabrėžia tinkamo tikslinimo procedūros svarbą, ypač palyginti mažesnių duomenų rinkinių atžvilgiu. Mūsų kodas pridedamas kaip papildomas.', 'mk': 'Моделирањето на јазикот со БЕРТ се состои од две фази на (i) ненадгледувана преобука за неозначен текст и (ii) фино прилагодување за специфична надгледувана задача. We present a method that leverages the second phase to its fullest, by applying an extensive number of parallel classifier heads, which are enforced to be orthogonal, while adaptively eliminating the weaker heads during training.  Правиме екстремна проценка меѓу и внатрешни податоци, покажувајќи дека нашиот метод ја подобрува генерализациската способност на БЕРТ, понекогаш водејќи до +9 отсто зголемување на прецизноста. Овие резултати ја истакнуваат важноста на соодветната процедура на финетизирање, особено за релативно помалите податоци. Нашиот код е приклучен како дополнителен.', 'ms': 'Modelan bahasa dengan BERT terdiri dari dua tahap (i) praselatihan tidak diawasi pada teks tidak berlebihan, dan (ii) penyesuaian untuk tugas tertentu yang diawasi. Kami memperkenalkan kaedah yang menggunakan fasa kedua untuk penuh, dengan melaksanakan nombor yang luas kepala pengklasifikasi paralel, yang dipaksa untuk menjadi ortogonal, sementara secara beradaptasi menghapuskan kepala yang lemah semasa latihan. Kami melakukan penilaian antar- dan intra-set data yang luas, menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kami meningkatkan kemampuan generalisasi BERT, kadang-kadang membawa kepada peningkatan tepatnya +9%. Keputusan ini menyatakan kepentingan prosedur penyesuaian yang tepat, terutama untuk set data yang berkurang kecil. Kod kita ditambah sebagai tambahan.', 'ml': 'ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയോടൊപ്പം ഭാഷ മോഡലിങ് രണ്ട് പദവികളുടെ (i) സൂക്ഷിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത മുന്നില പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ രണ്ട് പദവികളില്\u200d ഉണ്ട്. ഒരു പ്രത നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടാമത്തെ പ്രയോഗത്തിലേക്ക് പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. പരിശീലനത്തില്\u200d ദുര്\u200dബലരായ തലകള്\u200d നീക്കം ചെയ്യാന്\u200d നിര്\u200dബന്ധിക്കപ്പെടുന നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ ജനറലേഷന്\u200d കഴിവ് മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു എന്ന് കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ട് നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d ന ഇത്തരം ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ശരിയായ ഒരു നല്ല തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന പ്രക്രിയയുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണ്. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് ചെറിയ വലിപ്പം  നമ്മുടെ കോഡ് കൂടുതലായി ബന്ധപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു.', 'mt': 'L-immudellar tal-lingwi bil-BERT jikkonsisti f’żewġ fażijiet ta’ (i) taħriġ minn qabel mhux sorveljat dwar test mhux immarkat, u (ii) a ġġustament finat għal kompitu speċifiku sorveljat. Aħna nippreżentaw metodu li jgħaqqad it-tieni fażi bl-aktar mod sħiħ tiegħu, bl-applikazzjoni ta’ numru estensiv ta’ kapijiet tal-klassifikaturi paralleli, li huma infurzati biex ikunu ortogonali, filwaqt li b’mod adattiv jeliminaw il-kapijiet l-aktar dgħajfa matul it-taħriġ. Għandna nagħmlu evalwazzjoni estensiva bejn u ġewwa sett tad-dejta, li turi li l-metodu tagħna jtejjeb il-kapaċità ta’ ġeneralizzazzjoni tal-BERT, u xi kultant iwassal għal żieda ta’ +9% fil-preċiżjoni. Dawn ir-riżultati jenfasizzaw l-importanza ta’ proċedura xierqa ta’ rfinar, speċjalment għal settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ daqs relattivament iżgħar. Il-kodiċi tagħna huwa mehmuż bħala supplimentari.', 'mn': 'БЕРТ-тэй хэл модель нь (i) хэлээгүй текст дээр хоёр дасгал бөгөөд (ii) хэлээгүй дасгал бөгөөд (ii) хэлээгүй дасгал бөгөөд (ii) хэлээгүй дасгал бөгөөд (ii) хэлээгүй дасгал бөг Бид хоёр дахь дахь дахь дахь дахь дахь дахь дахь дахь нь бүрэлдэж, сургалтын үед илүү хүчтэй толгойд бага зэрэг параллел дахь толгойд хэрэглэх арга зам өгдөг. Бид интернет болон интернет өгөгдлийн сангийн өргөн дүгнэлт хийдэг. Бидний арга нь BERT-ын ерөнхийлөгчийн чадварыг сайжруулж, заримдаа +9% нь тодорхой нэмэгдүүлэх чадварыг харуулж байна. Эдгээр үр дүн нь зөв тохиромжтой процедурын чухал ач холбогдолтой, ялангуяа бага хэмжээний өгөгдлийн сангийн тухай. Бидний код нэмэлт хэлбэртэй холбогдсон.', 'no': 'Språk- modellering med BERT inneheld to fasar av i) ikkje- oppretta føreøving på ukjend tekst, og ii) finnstilling for ei spesifikke oversikt oppgåve. Vi presenterer ein metode som leverer den andre fasen til den fullstendiste, ved å bruka eit utvida tal parallelle klassifiseringskoff, som vert påkravd til å vera orthogonal, medan det er tilpassande å eliminere dei svakere hodene under opplæring. Vi gjer eit utvidende inter- og intra- datasettevaluering, som viser at metoden vårt forbedrar generelliseringsverdien av BERT, og noen gong fører til ein +9% ferdig i nøyaktighet. Desse resultatene highlight the importance of a proper fine-tuning procedure, especially for relatively smaller datasets. Koden vårt er kopla til som supplementar.', 'pl': 'Modelowanie językowe za pomocą BERT składa się z dwóch faz (i) szkolenia wstępnego bez nadzoru w zakresie tekstu nieoznakowanego oraz (ii) dostosowania do konkretnego nadzorowanego zadania. Przedstawiamy metodę, która w pełni wykorzystuje drugą fazę, poprzez zastosowanie dużej liczby równoległych głowic klasyfikacyjnych, które są wymuszane jako ortogonalne, przy jednoczesnym adaptacyjnym eliminowaniu słabszych głów podczas treningu. Przeprowadzamy obszerną ocenę między i wewnątrz zbiorów danych, pokazując, że nasza metoda poprawia zdolność uogólnienia BERT, czasami prowadząc do +9% wzrostu dokładności. Wyniki te podkreślają znaczenie odpowiedniej procedury dostrajania, zwłaszcza w przypadku stosunkowo mniejszych zbiorów danych. Nasz kod jest załączony jako uzupełniający.', 'ro': 'Modelarea lingvistică cu BERT constă în două faze de (i) pregătire prealabilă nesupravegheată asupra textului fără etichete și (ii) reglare fină pentru o sarcină supravegheată specifică. Vă prezentăm o metodă care valorifică cea de-a doua fază la maxim, prin aplicarea unui număr larg de capete paralele de clasificare, care sunt impuse să fie ortogonale, eliminând în același timp adaptiv capetele slabe în timpul antrenamentului. Realizăm o evaluare extinsă inter- și intra-set de date, arătând că metoda noastră îmbunătățește capacitatea de generalizare a BERT, uneori ducând la un creștere de +9% în precizie. Aceste rezultate evidențiază importanța unei proceduri adecvate de reglare fină, în special pentru seturile de date de dimensiuni relativ mici. Codul nostru este ataşat ca suplimentar.', 'sr': 'Modeliranje jezika sa BERT sastoji se od dve faze i) neodređene pre-obuke na nezabeliranom tekstu, i ii) finalno ispravljanje određenog nadzornog zadatka. Predstavljamo metodu koja utiče na drugu fazu na njenu najpotpunost, primjenjujući širok broj paralelnih klasifikatorskih glava, koji se primjenjuju da budu ortogonalni, dok adaptivno eliminišu slabije glave tokom treninga. Provodimo ogromnu procjenu među i unutrašnjim podacima, pokazujući da naša metoda poboljšava sposobnost generalizacije BERT-a, ponekad vodi do +9% poboljšanja tačnosti. Ovi rezultati ukazuju na važnost odgovarajuće postupke za finaliziranje, posebno za relativno manje podatke. Naš kod je priključen kao dodatak.', 'so': 'Tusaale ku qoran luuqada BERT waxaa ka mid ah labo fasax (i) oo aan la ilaalinayn waxbarasho ka hor-barashada qoraalka aan la labeyn, iyo (ii) hagaajinta shaqada gaar ah oo la ilaaliyo. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qaab ku habboon fasalka labaad si buuxda ah, marka lagu codsanayo madaxyo kala duduwan oo kala duduwan, kuwaas oo lagu qasbo inay u noqoto sida habboon, iyadoo lagu habboon eliyo madaxa tabarta yar xilliga waxbarashada. Waxaynu sameynaa qiimeyn dheeraad ah oo ka mid ah labada macluumaadka, waxaana tusinayaa in qaabkeennu uu koriyo awoodda dhalashada BERT, qaar marka qaarkood wuxuu ku caawinaa koritaanka 9% si saxda ah. Arrimahaan waxay ku muuqataa muhiimka u ah xeerarka hagaajinta si qumman, khusuusan u qoran kooxaha macluumaadka ee yar. Aqoonkayada waxaa loogu xiriiraa mid dheeraad ah.', 'ta': 'BERT உடன் மொழி மாதிரி இரண்டு வகுப்புகளில் (i) காப்பாற்றப்படாத முன்பயிற்சியில் உள்ளது, குறிப்பிட்ட கண்காணிப்பு செயலுக்கு நன்றான தூண்ட நாம் இரண்டாவது நிலையை முழுமையாக கொடுக்கும் முறையில் ஒரு முறையை கொண்டு வருகிறோம், அது பங்கீட்டு வகுப்பாளர் தலைவர்களை பயன்படுத்தும், அது போன்றுக்கொ நாம் ஒரு விரிவான இடைவெளி மற்றும் உள்ளமைப்பு தகவல் அமைப்பு மதிப்பினை செய்கிறோம். நம் முறையில் BERT பொதுவானத்தை மேம்படுத்தும் என்பதை காட் இந்த முடிவு எங்கள் குறியீடு கூடுதலாக இணைக்கப்பட்டது.', 'sv': 'Språkmodellering med BERT består av två faser av (i) oövervakad fortbildning om omärkt text och (ii) finjustering för en specifik övervakad uppgift. Vi presenterar en metod som utnyttjar den andra fasen till fullo, genom att tillämpa ett stort antal parallella klassificeringshuvuden, som tvingas vara ortogonala, samtidigt som adaptivt eliminerar de svagare huvudena under träning. Vi genomför en omfattande inter- och intradataset utvärdering, som visar att vår metod förbättrar BERT:s generaliseringsförmåga, vilket ibland leder till en ökning på +9% i noggrannhet. Dessa resultat belyser vikten av ett korrekt finjusteringsförfarande, särskilt för relativt små datamängder. Vår kod bifogas som tilläggskod.', 'si': 'BERT එක්ක භාෂාව මොඩේලන් එක්ක සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ වැඩක් සඳහා i) සාමාන්\u200dය නැති ප්\u200dරධානයක්  අපි දෙවෙනි ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වෙනුවෙන් දෙවෙනි ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පුළුවන් වෙනුවෙන්, සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂකයේ ඔළුවන් විශාල සංඛ්ය අපි විශාල විශාල විශාල- සහ ඇතුළු දත්ත සැට විශේෂණයක් කරනවා, පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විදියට BERT ගේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂණ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වැඩ මේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂය කරනවා, විශේෂයෙන්ම සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන අපේ කෝඩ් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයි.', 'ur': 'BERT کے مطابق زبان مدل کی دو مرحلے میں سے ہے جو (i) غیر قابل تعلیم پر قابل تعلیم نہیں کی گئی تھی اور (ii) ایک مخصوص تحت نظر کے کام کے لئے پاکیزہ تعلیم کرنا۔ ہم ایک طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں جو دوسری طریقہ کو اس کی پوری طریقہ پر اضافہ کرتا ہے، اس طریقہ سے ایک گھیری طرح کے سروں کی تعداد کے ذریعہ مطابق کرتا ہے کہ ان کے سروں کو دوسری طریقہ سے اضافہ کرتا ہے، جب تکلیف میں کمزور سروں کو اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ ہم ایک گھیرے اندر اور اندر ڈیٹ سٹ کی ارزیابی کرتے ہیں، جو دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ BERT کی عمومی قابلیت کو بہتر کرتا ہے، کبھی دقیقا +9% کے فائدہ کو پہنچاتا ہے۔ یہ نتائج ایک ٹھیک ٹھیک ٹھیک ٹونگ پردازی کی اہم بات کو تفصیل دیتے ہیں، مخصوصاً نسبتا چھوٹی سایز ڈاٹ سٹ کے لئے۔ ہمارا کیڈ اضافہ کے طور پر ملی ہے.', 'uz': "Name Biz ikkinchi darajaga katta bo'lgan usul bilan birinchi darajaga qo'yish usulni hozir qilamiz. Bu ta'lim paytida qo'shimcha parallel boshqaruvchilarni qo'llash mumkin. Biz bir tarkibi va intra- maʼlumotlar tarkibini qiymatlashimiz mumkin, bizning usuli BERT ijodkorligini oshirish imkoniyatini ko'rsatadi. Ba'zida esa, bir necha soʻzning 9% ta'limga ega bo'ladi. @ info: whatsthis Kodlash qoidamiz qoʻshish sifatida qoʻllangan.", 'vi': 'Cách chế biến ngôn ngữ với BERT gồm hai giai đoạn: i) chưa được giám sát trước huấn luyện trên văn bản không được dán, và II) độ cẩn thận cho một nhiệm vụ được giám sát cụ thể. Chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp dùng để điều khiển hết giai đoạn thứ hai, bằng cách áp dụng một số lượng lớn các đầu kẻ phân loại song song song, được buộc phải làm theo cấu trúc, đồng thời loại loại loại trừ những kẻ yếu nhất khi được huấn luyện. Chúng tôi tiến hành một đánh giá bao quát nội bộ dữ liệu, cho thấy phương pháp của chúng tôi cải thiện khả năng phát tán của BERT, đôi khi dẫn đến sự chính xác. Những kết quả này nhấn mạnh tầm quan trọng của một thủ tục sửa chữa thích hợp, đặc biệt cho các tập tin nhỏ hơn. Mã của chúng tôi được bổ sung.', 'hr': 'Modeliranje jezika sa BERT sastoji se od dvije faze i) neodređene predobuke na nezabeliranom tekstu, i ii) finalno ispravljanje određenog nadzornog zadatka. Predstavljamo metodu koja utječe na drugu fazu na njenu potpunost, primjenjivajući širok broj paralelnih klasifikatorskih glava, koji se primjenjuju kao ortogonalni, dok prilagodno eliminiraju slabije glave tijekom treninga. Provodimo ogromnu procjenu među i unutrašnjim podacima, pokazujući da naša metoda poboljšava sposobnost generalizacije BERT-a, ponekad dovede do +9% dobivanja tačnosti. Ovi rezultati naglašavaju važnost odgovarajućeg postupaka za finaliziranje, posebno za relativno manje podatke veličine. Naš kod je priključen kao dodatak.', 'da': "Sprogmodellering med BERT består af to faser af (i) uautoriseret forudgående træning om ikke-mærket tekst og (ii) finjustering til en bestemt overvåget opgave. Vi præsenterer en metode, der udnytter anden fase fuldt ud ved at anvende et omfattende antal parallelle klassificeringshoveder, som påtvinges at være retvinklede, samtidig med at de svageste hoveder tilpasses til træning. Vi gennemfører en omfattende inter- og intra-datasæt evaluering, der viser, at vores metode forbedrer BERT's generaliseringsevne, hvilket undertiden fører til en stigning på +9% i nøjagtighed. Disse resultater understreger vigtigheden af en ordentlig finjusteringsprocedure, især for relativt mindre datasæt. Vores kode er vedlagt som tillægskode.", 'bg': 'Езиковото моделиране с BERT се състои от две фази от (i) необуздано предварително обучение по текст без етикет и (ii) фина настройка за конкретна надзорна задача. Представяме метод, който използва втората фаза в максимална степен, чрез прилагане на голям брой паралелни класификационни глави, които се принуждават да бъдат правоъгълни, като същевременно адаптивно елиминират по-слабите глави по време на тренировка. Извършваме обширна оценка между и вътре в набора от данни, показваща, че методът ни подобрява способността за обобщаване на BERT, което понякога води до +9% повишаване на точността. Тези резултати подчертават важността на правилната процедура за фино регулиране, особено за сравнително по-малки масиви от данни. Кодексът ни е приложен като допълнителен.', 'nl': 'Taalmodellering met BERT bestaat uit twee fasen van (i) pre-training zonder toezicht op tekst zonder label en (ii) finetuning voor een specifieke begeleide taak. We presenteren een methode die de tweede fase optimaal benut, door een uitgebreid aantal parallelle classificatorkoppen toe te passen, die worden gedwongen orthogonaal te zijn, terwijl de zwakkere koppen tijdens de training adaptief worden geëlimineerd. We voeren een uitgebreide inter- en intra-dataset evaluatie uit, waaruit blijkt dat onze methode het generalisatievermogen van BERT verbetert, wat soms leidt tot een +9% toename in nauwkeurigheid. Deze resultaten benadrukken het belang van een goede fine-tuning procedure, vooral voor relatief kleinere datasets. Onze code is bijgevoegd als aanvulling.', 'id': 'Modeling bahasa dengan BERT terdiri dari dua tahap (i) prapelatihan tidak diawasi pada teks tanpa label, dan (ii) penyesuaian untuk tugas tertentu yang diawasi. Kami mempersembahkan metode yang mengaktifkan fase kedua ke yang paling penuh, dengan menerapkan jumlah ekstensif kepala klassifikasi paralel, yang dipaksa untuk menjadi ortogonal, sementara secara adaptif menghapuskan kepala yang lemah selama latihan. Kami melakukan evaluasi ekstensif inter- dan intra-dataset, menunjukkan bahwa metode kami meningkatkan kemampuan generalisasi BERT, kadang-kadang menyebabkan peningkatan akurasi +9%. Hasil-hasil ini menunjukkan penting prosedur penyesuaian yang tepat, terutama untuk set data ukuran relatif kecil. Kode kami ditampilkan sebagai tambahan.', 'de': 'Die Sprachmodellierung mit BERT besteht aus zwei Phasen (i) unbeaufsichtigtem Vortraining für unbeschrifteten Text und (ii) Feinabstimmung für eine bestimmte überwachte Aufgabe. Wir stellen eine Methode vor, die die zweite Phase voll ausschöpft, indem eine große Anzahl paralleler Klassifikatorköpfe angewendet wird, die orthogonal erzwungen werden, während die schwächeren Köpfe während des Trainings adaptiv eliminiert werden. Wir führen eine umfangreiche inter- und intra-dataset Auswertung durch, die zeigt, dass unsere Methode die Verallgemeinerungsfähigkeit von BERT verbessert, was manchmal zu einem +9% Anstieg der Genauigkeit führt. Diese Ergebnisse verdeutlichen die Bedeutung eines geeigneten Feinabstimmungsverfahrens, insbesondere für relativ kleinere Datensätze. Unser Kodex ist ergänzend beigefügt.', 'sw': 'Mfano wa lugha yenye BERT unajumuisha viwango viwili vya (i) vya mafunzo yasiyohifadhiwa kwa ujumbe usioeleweka, na (ii) vizuri kwa kazi maalum inayofuatiliwa. Tunaweza kuweka mbinu ambazo hupelekea hatua ya pili kwenye kiwango kikubwa kabisa, kwa kutumia idadi kubwa ya viongozi wa vipambavyo vinavyofanana, ambazo zinalazimishwa kuwa na upande wa kigaidi, na kwa makusudi kuondoa vichwa wanyonge wakati wa mafunzo. Tunafanya tathmini za kina kwa pamoja na taarifa za ndani, tukionesha kwamba njia yetu inaboresha uwezo wa uzalishaji wa BERT, wakati mwingine yanasababisha ongezeko la asilimia 9 kwa sahihi. Matokeo haya yanaonyesha umuhimu wa mchakato mzuri, hususani kwa seti za data ndogo. Utawala wetu umeunganishwa kama msaidizi.', 'ko': 'BERT 언어 모델링은 (i) 텍스트가 표시되지 않은 무감독 예행 훈련과 (ii) 특정 감독 임무의 미세한 조정을 포함한다.우리는 두 번째 단계를 충분히 이용하는 방법을 제시했다. 대량의 평행분류기 헤드를 응용함으로써 이런 평행분류기 헤드는 정교하게 강제되고 훈련 기간에 비교적 약한 분류기 헤드를 스스로 제거한다.광범위한 데이터 세트 간 및 데이터 세트 내 평가를 수행한 결과 BERT의 범용 성능이 향상되었고 때로는 +9%의 정확도가 향상되었습니다.이러한 결과는 적당한 마이크로스피커 프로그램의 중요성을 강조하였는데, 특히 상대적으로 작은 데이터 집합에 대해서는 더욱 그렇다.우리의 코드는 보충으로 첨부한다.', 'af': "Taal modellering met BERT bestaan van twee fase van (i) ongeonderwerp voor- onderwerp op ongeabelde teks, en (ii) fin- tuning vir 'n spesifieke onderwerp opdrag. Ons stel 'n metode wat die tweede fase a an sy volledige verwyder, deur 'n uitbreidige aantal parallele klassifiseerder koppe toewend te doen, wat versterk word om orthogonaal te wees, terwyl adaptief die swakkere koppe gedurende onderwerp te verwyder. Ons doen 'n uitbreidige inter- en intra- datastel evaluasie, wat wys dat ons metode die generelliseeringskapasiteit van BERT verbeter, soms lei na 'n +9% verskaf in presisiteit. Hierdie resultate verlig die belangrikheid van 'n regte fin- tuning prosedure, veral vir relativief klein- grootte datastelle. Ons kode is aangehou as supplementaar.", 'sq': 'Modelimi i gjuhës me BERT përbëhet nga dy faza i (i) parastërvitjes së pazgjidhur në tekst pa etiketë dhe (ii) përshtatjes për një detyrë specifike të mbikqyrur. We present a method that leverages the second phase to its fullest, by applying an extensive number of parallel classifier heads, which are enforced to be orthogonal, while adaptively eliminating the weaker heads during training.  Ne kryejmë një vlerësim të gjerë ndërmjet dhe brenda të dhënave, duke treguar se metoda jonë përmirëson aftësinë e gjeneralizimit të BERT, ndonjëherë duke çuar në një rritje +9% në saktësi. Këto rezultate theksojnë rëndësinë e një procedure të përshtatshme të rregullimit, veçanërisht për grupe të dhënash relativisht më të vogla. Our code is attached as supplementary.', 'hy': 'Language modeling with BERT consists of two phases of (i) unsupervised pre-training on unlabeled text, and (ii) fine-tuning for a specific supervised task.  We present a method that leverages the second phase to its fullest, by applying an extensive number of parallel classifier heads, which are enforced to be orthogonal, while adaptively eliminating the weaker heads during training.  We conduct an extensive inter- and intra-dataset evaluation, showing that our method improves the generalization ability of BERT, sometimes leading to a +9% gain in accuracy.  Այս արդյունքները ներկայացնում են ճիշտ բարձրացման գործընթացի կարևորությունը, հատկապես համեմատաբար փոքր տվյալների համակարգերի համար: Մեր կոդը միացված է որպես ավելացրական:', 'fa': 'مدل زبانی با BERT از دو مرحله پیش آموزش (i) بر متن غیر قابل نوشته و (ii) تنظیم برای یک کار مشخص شده است. ما روش دوم را نشان می دهیم که به طور کامل مرحله دوم را به طور کامل تحت تاثیر قرار می دهد، با استفاده کردن تعداد زیادی از سرهای مختلف\u200cکننده\u200cای که در طول آموزش مجبور می\u200cشوند به طور متعادلانه، سرهای ضعیف\u200cتر را از دست می\u200cدهند. ما یک ارزیابی بین و داخل مجموعه\u200cی داده\u200cها وسیع انجام می\u200cدهیم، که نشان می\u200cدهیم که روش ما توانایی عمومی BERT را بهتر می\u200cکند، گاهی به یک سود +9% دقیق می\u200cرسد. این نتیجه\u200cها اهمیت یک روش درست تنظیم کردن مناسب را مشخص می\u200cکنند، مخصوصا برای مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای نسبتا اندازه\u200cهای کوچکتر. کد ما به عنوان اضافه شده', 'az': 'BERT ilə dil modelləşdirilməsi iki fərz i) təhsil edilməmiş mətn və ii) müəyyən edilmiş i şlər üçün müəyyən edilməmiş təhsil edilmişdir. Biz ikinci fəzini tamamlamağa müvəffəq edən bir yolu göstəririk, təhsil sırasında daha zəif başlarını məhv edərək, böyük bir çox paralel klassifik başları uygulayaraq. Biz çox geniş inter-and intra-data set değerləşdiririk, metodumuzun BERT generalizasyon qabiliyyətini daha yaxşılaşdırır, bəzən +9% dəqiqliyinə çatdırır. Bu sonuçlar düzgün düzgün düzgün düzəltmə prosedüsinin vacibətini, xüsusilə daha kiçik ölçüdə veri qurğuları üçün işıqlandırır. Bizim kodumuz supplemental olarak bağlanmışdır.', 'tr': "BERT bilen dil modelleýşinde (i) sözlemeýän metin öňünden boýunça(i) taýýarlanmadyk we (ii) gözlemýän zady üçin düzeltmelidir. Biz ikinji sahypany dolumyna etmäge mümkin edýän bir yöntemi, parallel klasifikaty kellelerini etmäge mejbur edip, okuw wagtynda iň zayıf kellelerini taýýarlap ýitirýäris. Biz büyük bir inter- ve intra- veri seti değerlendirip, metodumuzun BERT'nin generalizasyon ukybatını geliştirdiğini gösterip, bazen doğru bir +9% kazandığını gösteriyoruz. Bu netijeler dogry ýalňyşlyk prosedüň wajyplygyny ýagtylaýar, ýöne iň kiçi Ululyk sanlary üçin ullanýar. Biziň kodymyz eklendir.", 'am': 'የቋንቋ ምሳሌ BERT በሁለት ደረጃዎች (i) ውስጥ ያልጠበቀው የፊደል ትምህርት በይፋ ጽሑፍ ላይ እና (ii) ለspecific የተጠበቀው ስራ መልካም tuning ነው፡፡ የሁለተኛውን ደረጃን ለመፍታት እናስገድዳለን፤ በተጨማሪው የተለያይነት ራሶችን በመጠቀም እናስገድዳለን፡፡ የዳታ-አካል እና የዳታ-ሰርቨር ማሳየት እናደርጋለን፡፡ እነዚህም ፍሬዎች የተሻለ የጥሩ ምርጫዎች፣ በተለየ ትንሽ መጠን የዳታ መስመር ግንኙነት ያሳያል፡፡ ኮዱን እንደ ጨዋታ ነው።', 'bn': 'বেরেটের সাথে ভাষার মডেলের মধ্যে রয়েছে (i) অরক্ষিত পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষণের দুটি ক্ষেত্রে এবং (ii) একটি নির্দিষ্ট পর্যবেক্ষণ করা কাজের জন্য ভাষার আমরা একটি পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করি যা দ্বিতীয় পর্যায়ের পুরোপুরি পর্যালোচনার মাধ্যমে দ্বিতীয় পর্যালোভাবে ব্যবহার করে, যা প্রশিক্ষণের সময় দুর্বল মাথাকে মুছে ফেলার আমরা বিস্তৃত ইন্টারনেট এবং ইন্টার-ডাটাসেটের বিভিন্ন মূল্য চালিয়ে যাচ্ছি, যেখানে দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি বিবেরেটের সাধারণ ক্ষমতা উন এই ফলাফল সঠিকভাবে ভালো টুনিং প্রক্রিয়ার গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, বিশেষ করে আপাতকভাবে ছোট ছোট তথ্য সেটের জন্য। আমাদের কোড সংযুক্ত।', 'ca': "La modelació lingüística amb BERT consisteix en dues fases de (i) formació previa no supervisada en text sense etiqueta, i (ii) ajustament per una tasca supervisada específica. Presentam un mètode que aprofita la segona fase al seu màxim, aplicant un gran nombre de cabells parallels de classificació, que són obligats a ser ortogonals, mentre eliminant adaptadament els cabells més dèbils durant l'entrenament. Fem una extensa evaluació entre i entre conjunts de dades, mostrant que el nostre mètode millora l'habilitat de generalització del BERT, de vegades portant a un increment de precisió del +9%. These results highlight the importance of a proper fine-tuning procedure, especially for relatively smaller-sized datasets.  El nostre codi està afegit com a suplementari.", 'et': 'Keele modelleerimine BERTiga koosneb i) märgistamata teksti järelevalveta eelkoolituse kahest etapist ja ii) konkreetse järelevalveülesande täpsustamisest. Esitleme meetodit, mis võimendab teist etappi täielikult, rakendades laia hulga paralleelseid klassifitseerimispeasid, mis on sunnitud olema ortogonaalsed, samas kohanduvalt kõrvaldades nõrgemad pead treeningu ajal. Viime läbi ulatusliku andmekogumitevahelise ja andmesisese hindamise, mis näitab, et meie meetod parandab BERTi üldistamisvõimet, mis mõnikord toob kaasa +9% täpsuse suurenemise. Need tulemused rõhutavad nõuetekohase täpsustamismenetluse tähtsust, eriti suhteliselt väiksemate andmekogumite puhul. Meie koodeks on lisatud lisaks.', 'bs': 'Modeliranje jezika sa BERT sastoji se od dvije faze i) neodređene predobuke na neizbiljnom tekstu, i ii) finaliziranje određenog nadzornog zadatka. Predstavljamo metodu koja utiče na drugu fazu na njenu potpunost, primjenjujući širok broj paralelnih klasifikatorskih glava, koji se primjenjuju da budu ortogonalni, dok adaptivno eliminišu slabije glave tijekom treninga. Provodimo ogromnu procjenu među i unutrašnjim podacima, pokazujući da naša metoda poboljšava sposobnost generalizacije BERT-a, ponekad dovede do +9% poboljšanja tačnosti. Ovi rezultati naglašavaju važnost odgovarajuće postupke finaliziranja, posebno za relativno manje podatke. Naš kod je priključen kao dodatak.', 'fi': 'BERT-kielimallinnus koostuu kahdesta vaiheesta (i) valvomattomasta merkitsemättömän tekstin esikoulutuksesta ja (ii) hienosäätöstä tiettyä valvottua tehtävää varten. Esittelemme menetelmän, joka hyödyntää toista vaihetta täysimääräisesti soveltamalla laajaa määrää rinnakkaisia luokittelupäitä, jotka pakotetaan olemaan ortogonaalisia, samalla kun heikommat päät poistetaan adaptiivisesti harjoittelun aikana. Teemme laajan aineistojen välisen ja sisäisen arvioinnin, joka osoittaa, että menetelmämme parantaa BERT:n yleistymiskykyä ja johtaa joskus +9%:n tarkkuuden kasvuun. Tulokset korostavat kunnollisen hienosäätömenettelyn merkitystä erityisesti suhteellisen pienissä aineistoissa. Koodimme on liitteenä täydentävinä.', 'cs': 'Jazykové modelování pomocí BERT se skládá ze dvou fází (i) bez dohledu předškolení na neoznačený text a (ii) jemného ladění pro konkrétní kontrolovaný úkol. Představujeme metodu, která naplno využívá druhou fázi, aplikací rozsáhlého počtu paralelních klasifikátorů, které jsou vynuceny jako ortogonální, přičemž adaptivně eliminují slabší hlavy během tréninku. Provádíme rozsáhlé vyhodnocení mezi a intra datovými sadami, které ukazuje, že naše metoda zlepšuje generalizační schopnost BERT, někdy vede k +9% zvýšení přesnosti. Tyto výsledky zdůrazňují důležitost řádného jemného ladění, zejména u relativně menších datových sad. Náš kód je připojen jako doplňkový.', 'he': 'דוגמנית שפה עם BERT מורכבת משני שלבים של (i) אימון מראש לא מעוקב על טקסט ללא סימנים, ו (ii) התרגיל למשימה מפורסמת ספציפית. We present a method that leverages the second phase to its fullest, by applying an extensive number of parallel classifier heads, which are enforced to be orthogonal, while adaptively eliminating the weaker heads during training.  אנו מבצעים עריכה רחבה בין ומערכת נתונים, שמראה ששיטתנו משפר את יכולת הגנרליזציה של BERT, לפעמים מובילה לזכות +9% בדיקת. התוצאות האלה מזכירות את חשיבות תהליך מתאים מתאים, במיוחד עבור קבוצות נתונים קטנות יחסית. הקוד שלנו מחובר בתוספת.', 'ha': "Salon da aka ƙunsa da BERT na daga fasa biyu na (i) wanda ba'a tsare wa pre-lõkaci na rubutun da ba'a rubutu ba, kuma (ii) mai kyau-tuning wa wani aikin da aka tsare. Tuna gabatar da wani hanyoyi wanda ke jefa fasa na biyu zuwa cikakken, da za'a yi amfani da wasu jama'a mãsu daidaita, wanda za'a lazimta su zama orthogonal, kuma a goge masu rauni a lokacin da za'a yi amfani da shi. We conduct an extensive inter- and intra-dataset evaluation, showing that our method improves the generalization ability of BERT, sometimes leading to a +9% gain in accuracy.  Wannan matsala na ƙayyade muhimu wa aikin tunkuɗe wa daidai mai kyau, kuma hususanci ga daidaita danaɓa masu ƙarami. An haɗa kowanmu kamar ƙari.", 'sk': 'Modeliranje jezikov z BERT je sestavljeno iz dveh faz (i) nenadzorovanega predusposabljanja o neoznačenem besedilu in (ii) natančnega nastavitve za določeno nadzorovano nalogo. Predstavljamo metodo, ki v celoti izkoristi drugo fazo z uporabo obsežnega števila vzporednih klasifikacijskih glav, ki so prisiljene biti pravokotne, medtem ko prilagodljivo odpravljajo šibkejše glave med treningom. Izvajamo obsežno medpodatkovno in znotraj nabora podatkov, ki dokazuje, da naša metoda izboljšuje sposobnost generalizacije BERT, včasih pa povzroči +9% povečanje natančnosti. Ti rezultati poudarjajo pomen ustreznega postopka finega uravnavanja, zlasti za sorazmerno manjše nabore podatkov. Naš kodeks je priložen kot dopolnilni.', 'bo': 'BERT དང་སྐད་ཡིག་མིའི་རྣམ་པ་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་གཟུགས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ཕྱོགས་གཟུགས་མེད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ། ང་ཚོས་ཕྱོགས་གཞན་གཉིས་པ་དེ་མཐའ་གཤམ་གཉིས་པ་ལ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་method་འདིའི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྡན་དང་ནང་འཁོར་སྐྱོད་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལྟར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། གནད་སྡུད་འདི་དག་ནི་ཕལ་ཆེར་ཞིབ་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ལས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་གལ་ཆེ་ཆུང་ལ་དམིགས་གཏོང་བྱེད་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ཨང་ཀྱིས་ཁ་སྣོན་ལ་སྦྱར་བའི་རྩིས་ཡོད་པ་རེད།', 'jv': 'Ascension Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing wis nggawe tanggal segondi tanggal gawe nggawe, iso nggawe gantawak dhéwé kesempal kanggo kelas terakhir, sing dipolerané nggawe ortoggonal, terus apik dhéwé, akeh iso nggawe ngubah dhéwé Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem inter- karo data set ambekan, iso nggawe ngubah cara nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang BERT kang dipolerans, dadi iso nggawe +% sampeyan katimbang atik dadi. Ndoleh-Ngerawat iki bakal segalui nggawe barang nggawe operasi sing dibutuhke tur angel, supoyo kanggo dataset sing nyimpen kuwi nggolok barang. Cover'}
{'en': 'Dictionary-based Debiasing of Pre-trained Word Embeddings', 'ar': 'إزالة الحواف المعتمد على القاموس من Word Embeddings المدربة مسبقًا', 'fr': 'Débiaisement basé sur le dictionnaire des intégrations de mots pré-entraînées', 'es': 'Debiasing basado en diccionarios de incrustaciones de palabras previamente entrenadas', 'pt': 'Debiasing baseado em dicionário de incorporações de palavras pré-treinadas', 'ja': '事前にトレーニングされた単語埋め込みの辞書ベースのデビアシング', 'ru': 'Девиация предварительно обученных вложений слов на основе словаря', 'zh': '盖字典之预训练词嵌之去倚也', 'hi': 'शब्दकोश-आधारित Debiasing के पूर्व प्रशिक्षित Word Embeddings', 'ga': 'Debiasing Foclóir-bhunaithe Leabaithe Focal Réamh-oilte', 'ka': 'სიტყვანის დაბათებული Debiasing წინ შესწავლა სიტყვანის შებეჭდვის', 'el': 'Αποκάλυψη με βάση το λεξικό των προ-εκπαιδευμένων ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων', 'hu': 'Az előképzett szóbeágyazások szótáralapú vitalistája', 'it': 'Debiasing basato sul dizionario di incorporazioni di parole pre-addestrate', 'kk': 'Сөздік негіздеген алдын- оқылған сөзді ендіру', 'mk': 'Разговарање на предобучени вградувања на зборови базирано на речник', 'lt': 'Iš anksto parengtų žodžių įterpimų Debiasing pagal žodžius', 'ms': 'Penyesuaian Perkataan Berasas Kamus Penyesuaian Perkataan Terlatih', 'mt': 'Dikjarazzjoni bbażata fuq id-Dikjarazzjoni ta’ Embeddings tal-kliem imħarrġa minn qabel', 'mn': 'Дүгнэлт суурилсан өмнө сургалтын үгний нэмбэлүүдийн Debiasing', 'ml': 'പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്ക് എംബെഡിങ്ങുകളുടെ നിഘണ്ടിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള ഡീബിയേസ്', 'no': '@ label: listbox KDE distribution method', 'ro': 'Dezbaterea bazată pe dicționar a încorporărilor de cuvinte pre-instruite', 'pl': 'Debiasowanie oparte na słowniku wstępnie przeszkolonych osadzeń słowa', 'sr': 'Debiasing predobučenih reči na rečniku', 'sv': 'Ordbok baserad Debiasing av förklädda ordinbäddningar', 'so': 'Debiasing of pre-trained Ereyga', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණිත වචන සම්බන්ධයක් විදිහට අධික විදිහට ඇතුළත් විදිහය', 'ta': 'முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட வார்த்தை உடைப்புகளின் அகராதியில் அடிப்படையாக்குதல்', 'ur': 'پہلے تربین کی ویڈ امڈینگ کے ڈبیزانگ بنیاد دی جاتی ہے', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Diễn tập từ điển', 'hr': 'Debiasing predobučenih uključenih riječi na riječima', 'bg': 'Речник-базирано дебиазиране на предварително обучени вграждания на думи', 'da': 'Ordbogsbaseret debiasing af forududdannede ordindlejringer', 'nl': 'Op woordenboek gebaseerde debiasing van vooraf getrainde Word Embeddings', 'de': 'Wörterbuchbasierte Debiasing von vorgetrainierten Word Embeddings', 'ko': '사전 기반의 예비 훈련 단어 삽입 차용', 'tr': 'Sözlük tabanly Öňki eğlenen söz girişiminiň Debiasing', 'sw': 'Kuchukuliwa kwa lugha inayotumika na Lugha Kuhusu Mazungumzo ya Tafadhali', 'fa': 'Debiasing based on Dictionary of Pre- Trained Words', 'id': 'Debiasing berdasarkan kamus dari Embedding Word Pra-terlatih', 'sq': 'Debiasing-based Dictionary of Pre-Trained Word Embeddings', 'af': 'Woordeboek- gebaseerde Debiasing van vooraf- opgelei woord Inbêding', 'az': 'Sözlük-tabanlı Ön təhsil edilmiş Sözlük İfadələrinin Debiasing', 'hy': 'Բառարանի հիմնված նախապատրաստված բառերի ներգրավման', 'bn': 'ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক প্রশিক্ষিত শব্দ এমবেডিং এর ডিবিয়েজ', 'am': 'የመዝገበ ቃላት ምርጫዎች', 'bs': 'Debiasing predobučenih uključenih riječi na rečniku', 'cs': 'Debiasing předškolených vložení slov založených na slovníku', 'et': 'Sõnastikupõhine eelõpetatud sõnade põimimine', 'fi': 'Esikoulutettujen sanamuotojen sanakirjapohjainen Debiasing', 'ca': "Debiasing de l'incorporació de paraules pré-entrenada basada en el diccionari", 'sk': 'Debiasing v slovarju predhodno usposobljenih besednih vdelav', 'he': 'Dictionary-based Debiasing of Pre-trained Word Embeddings', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Dijilok-basa Debia sing Kelangan Aku Mbalaman sing Rasa Ketoken', 'bo': 'Dictionary-based Debiasing of Pre-trained Word Embeddings'}
{'en': 'Word embeddings trained on large corpora have shown to encode high levels of unfair discriminatory gender, racial, religious and ethnic biases. In contrast, human-written dictionaries describe the meanings of words in a concise, objective and an unbiased manner. We propose a method for debiasing pre-trained word embeddings using dictionaries, without requiring access to the original training resources or any knowledge regarding the word embedding algorithms used. Unlike prior work, our proposed method does not require the types of biases to be pre-defined in the form of word lists, and learns the constraints that must be satisfied by unbiased word embeddings automatically from dictionary definitions of the words. Specifically, we learn an encoder to generate a debiased version of an input word embedding such that it (a) retains the semantics of the pre-trained word embedding, (b) agrees with the unbiased definition of the word according to the dictionary, and (c) remains orthogonal to the vector space spanned by any biased basis vectors in the pre-trained word embedding space. Experimental results on standard benchmark datasets show that the proposed method can accurately remove unfair biases encoded in pre-trained word embeddings, while preserving useful semantics.', 'ar': 'أظهرت حفلات الزفاف المدربة على مجموعات كبيرة أنها ترمز إلى مستويات عالية من التمييز غير العادل بين الجنسين والتمييز العنصري والديني والعرقي. في المقابل ، تصف القواميس المكتوبة من قبل الإنسان معاني الكلمات بطريقة موجزة وموضوعية وغير متحيزة. نقترح طريقة لإزالة الحواف التي تم تدريبها مسبقًا على حفلات الزفاف باستخدام القواميس ، دون الحاجة إلى الوصول إلى موارد التدريب الأصلية أو أي معرفة بخصوص خوارزميات تضمين الكلمة المستخدمة. على عكس العمل السابق ، لا تتطلب طريقتنا المقترحة تحديد أنواع التحيزات مسبقًا في شكل قوائم كلمات ، وتتعلم القيود التي يجب تلبيتها من خلال تضمين الكلمات غير المتحيزة تلقائيًا من تعريفات القاموس للكلمات. على وجه التحديد ، نتعلم برنامج تشفير لإنشاء نسخة منقحة من كلمة إدخال مضمنة بحيث (أ) تحتفظ بدلالات الكلمات التي تم تدريبها مسبقًا ، (ب) توافق على التعريف غير المتحيز للكلمة وفقًا للقاموس ، و (ج) يظل متعامدًا مع فضاء المتجه الممتد بأي ناقلات أساس متحيزة في مساحة تضمين الكلمة المُدرَّبة مسبقًا. تظهر النتائج التجريبية على مجموعات البيانات المعيارية القياسية أن الطريقة المقترحة يمكن أن تزيل بدقة التحيزات غير العادلة المشفرة في عمليات دمج الكلمات المدربة مسبقًا ، مع الحفاظ على الدلالات المفيدة.', 'pt': 'Incorporações de palavras treinadas em grandes corpora mostraram codificar altos níveis de preconceitos discriminatórios injustos de gênero, raça, religião e etnia. Em contraste, os dicionários escritos por humanos descrevem os significados das palavras de maneira concisa, objetiva e imparcial. Propomos um método para debiasing de word embeddings pré-treinados usando dicionários, sem a necessidade de acesso aos recursos de treinamento originais ou qualquer conhecimento sobre os algoritmos de word embedding usados. Ao contrário do trabalho anterior, nosso método proposto não exige que os tipos de vieses sejam pré-definidos na forma de listas de palavras, e aprende as restrições que devem ser satisfeitas pela incorporação de palavras imparciais automaticamente a partir das definições de dicionário das palavras. Especificamente, aprendemos um codificador para gerar uma versão não tendenciosa de uma incorporação de palavras de entrada de modo que (a) retenha a semântica da incorporação de palavras pré-treinada, (b) concorde com a definição imparcial da palavra de acordo com o dicionário e (c) permanece ortogonal ao espaço vetorial gerado por quaisquer vetores de base polarizados no espaço de incorporação de palavras pré-treinadas. Resultados experimentais em conjuntos de dados de benchmark padrão mostram que o método proposto pode remover com precisão vieses injustos codificados em incorporações de palavras pré-treinadas, preservando semântica útil.', 'fr': "Les intégrations de mots formées sur de grands corpus ont montré qu'elles encodent des niveaux élevés de préjugés sexistes, raciaux, religieux et ethniques discriminatoires et injustes. En revanche, les dictionnaires écrits par des humains décrivent le sens des mots d'une manière concise, objective et impartiale. Nous proposons une méthode pour débiaiser les intégrations de mots pré-entraînées à l'aide de dictionnaires, sans avoir besoin d'accéder aux ressources de formation originales ni de connaissances concernant les algorithmes d'intégration de mots utilisés. Contrairement aux travaux antérieurs, la méthode que nous proposons ne nécessite pas que les types de biais soient prédéfinis sous forme de listes de mots, et apprend automatiquement les contraintes qui doivent être satisfaites par des intégrations de mots impartiales à partir des définitions de dictionnaire des mots. Plus précisément, nous apprenons qu'un codeur génère une version débiaisée d'un enrobage de mot d'entrée de telle sorte que (a) il conserve la sémantique de l'intégration de mots pré-entraînés, (b) soit en accord avec la définition non biaisée du mot selon le dictionnaire, et (c) reste orthogonal à l'espace vectoriel couvert par tout des vecteurs de base biaisés dans l'espace d'inclusion de mots préentraîné. Les résultats expérimentaux sur des ensembles de données de référence standard montrent que la méthode proposée peut éliminer avec précision les biais injustes codés dans des intégrations de mots préentraînées, tout en préservant une sémantique utile.", 'es': 'Las incorporaciones de palabras capacitadas en grandes corpus han demostrado codificar altos niveles de prejuicios discriminatorios injustos de género, raciales, religiosos y étnicos. Por el contrario, los diccionarios escritos por humanos describen el significado de las palabras de manera concisa, objetiva e imparcial. Proponemos un método para debilitar las incrustaciones de palabras previamente entrenadas mediante diccionarios, sin requerir acceso a los recursos de capacitación originales ni ningún conocimiento sobre los algoritmos de incrustación de palabras utilizados. A diferencia del trabajo anterior, nuestro método propuesto no requiere que los tipos de sesgos estén predefinidos en forma de listas de palabras, y aprende las restricciones que deben satisfacerse mediante la incrustación de palabras imparcial automáticamente a partir de las definiciones del diccionario de las palabras. Específicamente, aprendemos un codificador para generar una versión sesgada de la incrustación de una palabra de entrada de manera que (a) conserve la semántica de la incrustación de palabras previamente entrenadas, (b) esté de acuerdo con la definición imparcial de la palabra según el diccionario, y (c) permanezca ortogonal al espacio vectorial abarcado por cualquier vectores de base sesgados en el espacio de inserción de palabras previamente entrenado. Los resultados experimentales en conjuntos de datos de referencia estándar muestran que el método propuesto puede eliminar con precisión los sesgos injustos codificados en incrustaciones de palabras previamente entrenadas, al tiempo que preserva la semántica útil.', 'ja': '大規模なコーパスでトレーニングされたワード埋め込みは、高いレベルの不公平な差別的性別、人種、宗教、民族的偏見をコードすることが示されています。 対照的に、人間が書いた辞書は、単語の意味を簡潔で客観的で偏りのない方法で記述しています。 事前にトレーニングされた単語埋め込みを辞書を使用してデビアスする方法を提案します。元のトレーニングリソースへのアクセスや、使用された単語埋め込みアルゴリズムに関する知識は必要ありません。 先行研究とは異なり、提案された方法では、バイアスの種類を単語リストの形式で事前に定義する必要はなく、単語の辞書定義から自動的に偏りのない単語埋め込みによって満たされなければならない制約を学習します。 具体的には、（ ａ ）事前に訓練された単語埋め込みのセマンティクスを保持し、（ ｂ ）辞書に従って単語の偏りのない定義に同意し、（ ｃ ）事前に訓練された単語埋め込み空間内の任意の偏った基底ベクトルによってスパンされるベクトル空間に直交したままであるように、入力単語埋め込みのデビアライズされたバージョンを生成するためのエンコーダを学習する。 標準的なベンチマークデータセットの実験結果は、提案された方法は、有用な意味を保持しながら、事前に訓練された単語埋め込みにエンコードされた不公平なバイアスを正確に除去することができることを示しています。', 'zh': '于大语料库训练之词,嵌已证可编码高不平之歧视性别,种种教夷偏见。 比之于人,词典以简洁,观正述单词之义。 吾等建一用字典于预先训练词嵌偏倚之法,而无访原始训练资源、有所用词销算法者。 与前事不同,不求单词列表预定义偏差之类,而自学于单词字典,必因无偏之词以足其约束。 具体来说学一编码器以生输词销偏性版本,使(a)存预练之语义,(b)随字典许该词无偏定义,且(c)正交于预练之词嵌空中一切偏差基向量跨向量空间。 准集上之实验结果表明,所出之法,正消预训练词嵌中编码不平偏差,兼存有用之语义。', 'hi': 'बड़े कॉर्पोरेट पर प्रशिक्षित शब्द एम्बेडिंग ने अनुचित भेदभावपूर्ण लिंग, नस्लीय, धार्मिक और जातीय पूर्वाग्रहों के उच्च स्तर को एन्कोड करने के लिए दिखाया है। इसके विपरीत, मानव-लिखित शब्दकोश एक संक्षिप्त, उद्देश्य और निष्पक्ष तरीके से शब्दों के अर्थों का वर्णन करते हैं। हम शब्दकोशों का उपयोग करके पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित शब्द एम्बेडिंग को डिबियासिंग करने के लिए एक विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, मूल प्रशिक्षण संसाधनों तक पहुंच की आवश्यकता के बिना या उपयोग किए गए शब्द एम्बेडिंग एल्गोरिदम के बारे में किसी भी ज्ञान की आवश्यकता के बिना। पूर्व कार्य के विपरीत, हमारी प्रस्तावित विधि को शब्द सूचियों के रूप में पूर्व-परिभाषित करने के लिए पूर्वाग्रहों के प्रकारों की आवश्यकता नहीं होती है, और उन बाधाओं को सीखता है जिन्हें शब्दों की शब्दकोश परिभाषाओं से स्वचालित रूप से निष्पक्ष शब्द एम्बेडिंग द्वारा संतुष्ट किया जाना चाहिए। विशेष रूप से, हम एक इनपुट शब्द एम्बेडिंग का एक निष्पक्ष संस्करण उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक एन्कोडर सीखते हैं जैसे कि यह (ए) पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित शब्द एम्बेडिंग के शब्दार्थ को बरकरार रखता है, (बी) शब्दकोश के अनुसार शब्द की निष्पक्ष परिभाषा से सहमत है, और (सी) पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित शब्द एम्बेडिंग स्पेस में किसी भी पक्षपाती आधार वैक्टर द्वारा फैलाए गए वेक्टर स्पेस के लिए ओर्थोगोनल रहता है। मानक बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि प्रस्तावित विधि उपयोगी शब्दार्थ को संरक्षित करते हुए, पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित शब्द एम्बेडिंग में एन्कोड किए गए अनुचित पूर्वाग्रहों को सही ढंग से हटा सकती है।', 'ru': 'Учебная подготовка по вопросам использования слов на крупных предприятиях показала, что в них широко распространены несправедливые дискриминационные гендерные, расовые, религиозные и этнические предрассудки. Напротив, словари, написанные человеком, описывают значения слов в сжатой, объективной и непредвзятой форме. Предложен способ удаления предварительно обученных вложений слов с помощью словарей, не требуя доступа к исходным обучающим ресурсам или каких-либо знаний об используемых алгоритмах встраивания слов. В отличие от предыдущей работы, предлагаемый нами метод не требует предопределения типов смещений в виде списков слов, а изучает ограничения, которые должны выполняться непредвзятыми вложениями слов автоматически из словарных определений слов. В частности, мы узнаем, что кодер генерирует смещенную версию вложения входного слова таким образом, что он (a) сохраняет семантику вложения предварительно обученного слова, (b) согласуется с непредвзятым определением слова согласно словарю, и (c) остается ортогональным к векторному пространству, охватываемому любыми векторами смещенной основы в пространстве вложения предварительно обученного слова. Экспериментальные результаты по стандартным эталонным наборам данных показывают, что предлагаемый метод может точно удалять несправедливые смещения, закодированные в предварительно обученных вложениях слов, сохраняя при этом полезную семантику.', 'ga': 'Léiríodh go n-ionchódaíonn leabaithe focal atá oilte ar chorpas mór leibhéil arda de chlaonadh éagórach inscne, ciníoch, reiligiúnach agus eitneach. I gcodarsnacht leis sin, cuireann foclóirí daonna-scríofa síos ar bhrí na bhfocal ar bhealach gonta, oibiachtúil agus neamhchlaonta. Molaimid modh chun leabú focal réamhoilte a phlé trí úsáid a bhaint as foclóirí, gan rochtain ar na hacmhainní oiliúna bunaidh ná aon eolas maidir leis na halgartaim leabaithe focal a úsáidtear. Murab ionann agus réamhobair, ní éilíonn ár modh molta go ndéanfaí na cineálacha laofachta a réamhshainiú i bhfoirm liostaí focal, agus foghlaimíonn sé na srianta nach mór a shásamh trí leabú focal neamhchlaonta go huathoibríoch ó shainmhínithe foclóra ar na focail. Go sonrach, foghlaimímid ionchódóir chun leagan claonta de leabú focal ionchuir a ghiniúint sa chaoi go (a) go gcoimeádann sé leabú an fhocail réamh-oilte, (b) go n-aontaíonn sé le sainmhíniú neamhchlaonta an fhocail de réir an fhoclóra, agus (c) fanann sé orthogonal leis an spás veicteora atá trasnaithe ag aon veicteoirí bonn claonta sa spás leabaithe focal réamhoilte. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar thacair sonraí tagarmharcála caighdeánacha gur féidir leis an modh atá beartaithe laofachtaí éagóracha atá ionchódaithe i leabaithe focal réamhoilte a bhaint go cruinn, agus ag an am céanna ag caomhnú séimeantaic úsáideach.', 'ka': 'სიტყვები, რომელიც დიდი კოპორაში განაკეთებული სიტყვები, გამოჩვენებულია, რომ უფრო მარტივი სიტყვების დისკრიმინაციური გენდერი, პაციალური, რელიგიური და ეტნიკურ კონტრესტურად, ადამიანის წერტილი სიტყვებები აღწერს სიტყვების სანიშვნელობას კონტრესტი, ობიექტური და არაწერტილი ნაწილად. ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ წინასწარმატებული სიტყვების გამოყენება სტრიქტორიების გამოყენებას, რომელიც არ უნდა მიყენება ორიგინალური განაკეთებული რესურსების მისამართლად, ან ყველა ცოცხლებ პირველი სამუშაო განსხვავებაში, ჩვენი პროგრამა არ მოჭირდება სამუშაო სიტყვების სიტყვების ფორმაში, რომელიც სამუშაო სიტყვების განსხვავებაზე უნდა იყოს სამუშაო სიტყვების განსხვავებაზე. განსაკუთრებულად, ჩვენ ვისწავლით კოდერის შექმნა დებიზაციული სიტყვის ვერსია, რომელიც შექმნილი სიტყვის შექმნა, როგორც a) მართლაც წინ შექმნილი სიტყვის სმენტიკის შექმნა, b) სიტყვის განსაკუთრებულად სიტყვის განსაკუთრებულად დავწყება, და c) მართლაც ორტოდონალ ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები სტანდარტული ბენქმარიკის მონაცემების შესახებ, რომ პროგრამეტს შეუძლია მართლად გადაწყენოთ არაფექტიური წინასწორები, რომლებიც საჭირო სემენტი', 'el': 'Οι ενσωμάτωση λέξεων που εκπαιδεύονται σε μεγάλα σώματα έχουν δείξει ότι κωδικοποιούν υψηλά επίπεδα αθέμιτων διακρίσεων φύλου, φυλετικών, θρησκευτικών και εθνοτικών προκαταλήψεων. Αντίθετα, τα ανθρώπινα λεξικά περιγράφουν τις έννοιες των λέξεων με συνοπτικό, αντικειμενικό και αμερόληπτο τρόπο. Προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο για την απομάκρυνση των προ-εκπαιδευμένων ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων χρησιμοποιώντας λεξικά, χωρίς να απαιτείται πρόσβαση στους αρχικούς εκπαιδευτικούς πόρους ή οποιαδήποτε γνώση σχετικά με τους αλγόριθμους ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων που χρησιμοποιούνται. Σε αντίθεση με τις προηγούμενες εργασίες, η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος δεν απαιτεί να προκαθορίζονται οι τύποι προκατάληψης με τη μορφή καταλόγων λέξεων και μαθαίνει τους περιορισμούς που πρέπει να ικανοποιούνται από αμερόληπτες ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων αυτόματα από τους ορισμούς λεξικών των λέξεων. Συγκεκριμένα, μαθαίνουμε έναν κωδικοποιητή για να παράγουμε μια προκατειλημμένη έκδοση μιας λέξης εισαγωγής έτσι ώστε (α) να διατηρεί τη σημασιολογία της προκαθορισμένης λέξης ενσωμάτωσης, (β) να συμφωνεί με τον αμερόληπτο ορισμό της λέξης σύμφωνα με το λεξικό, και (γ) να παραμένει ορθογώνιο στο διανυσματικό διάστημα που εκτείνεται από οποιαδήποτε προκατειλημμένα διανύσματα βάσης στο προκαθορισμένο χώρο ενσωμάτωσης λέξης. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε τυποποιημένα σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος μπορεί με ακρίβεια να αφαιρέσει αθέμιτες προκαταλήψεις κωδικοποιημένες σε προ-εκπαιδευμένες ενσωματώσεις λέξεων, διατηρώντας παράλληλα χρήσιμη σημασιολογία.', 'hu': 'A nagy corporákra képzett szóbeágyazások kimutatták, hogy a nemek, faji, vallási és etnikai előítéletek magas szintű diszkriminatív megkülönböztetését kódolják. Ezzel szemben az emberi írású szótárak tömör, objektív és elfogulatlan módon írják le a szavak jelentését. Javasolunk egy módszert az előre képzett szóbeágyazások szótárak segítségével történő lebontására, anélkül, hogy hozzáférést igényelne az eredeti képzési erőforrásokhoz vagy az alkalmazott szóbeágyazási algoritmusokhoz kapcsolódó ismeretekhez. A korábbi munkákkal ellentétben javasolt módszerünk nem igényli, hogy az elfogultságok típusait előre definiáljuk szólisták formájában, és megtanuljuk azokat a korlátozásokat, amelyeket elfogulatlan szóbeágyazással kell kielégíteni automatikusan a szótár definícióiból. Konkrétan megtanuljuk, hogy egy kódolót hozzon létre egy beviteli szó beágyazásának elfogulatlan verzióját úgy, hogy (a) megőrizze az előkészített szó beágyazásának szemantikáját, (b) egyetért a szó elfogulatlan definíciójával a szótár szerint, és (c) ortogonális maradjon az előkészített szó beágyazási térben bármely elfogult alapvektor által átfogó vektortérhez. A standard benchmark adatkészletek kísérleti eredményei azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt módszer pontosan eltávolítja az előre képzett szóbeágyazásokban kódolt tisztességtelen elfogultságokat, miközben megőrzi a hasznos szemantikát.', 'it': "Le incorporazioni di parole formate sui grandi corpora hanno dimostrato di codificare alti livelli di ingiusti pregiudizi discriminatori di genere, razza, religione ed etnia. Al contrario, i dizionari scritti dall'uomo descrivono il significato delle parole in modo conciso, oggettivo e imparziale. Proponiamo un metodo per debiasing di embedding di parole pre-addestrate utilizzando dizionari, senza richiedere l'accesso alle risorse di formazione originali o alcuna conoscenza circa gli algoritmi di embedding di parole utilizzati. A differenza del lavoro precedente, il nostro metodo proposto non richiede che i tipi di bias siano predefiniti sotto forma di elenchi di parole, e impara i vincoli che devono essere soddisfatti da incorporazioni di parole imparziali automaticamente dalle definizioni del dizionario delle parole. Nello specifico, impariamo un encoder per generare una versione debiased di una parola di input incorporando in modo tale che (a) mantenga la semantica dell'incorporazione di parola pre-addestrata, (b) concordi con la definizione imparziale della parola secondo il dizionario, e (c) rimanga ortogonale allo spazio vettoriale abbracciato da qualsiasi vettore base biased nello spazio di incorporazione di parola pre-addestrato. I risultati sperimentali su set di dati standard di benchmark mostrano che il metodo proposto può rimuovere accuratamente i bias ingiusti codificati in incorporazioni di parole pre-addestrate, preservando al contempo la semantica utile.", 'lt': 'Word embeddings trained on large corpora have shown to encode high levels of unfair discriminatory gender, racial, religious and ethnic biases.  Priešingai, žmogaus rašytiniai žodynai trumpai, objektyviai ir nešališkai apibūdina žodžių reikšmes. Mes siūlome metodą, pagal kurį iš anksto apmokyti žodžių įterpimai būtų mažinami naudojant žodynus, nereikalaujant galimybės naudotis pradiniais mokymo ištekliais arba bet kokiomis žiniomis apie naudojamus žodžius įterpimo algoritmus. Priešingai nei ankstesnis darbas, mūsų siūlomas metodas nereikalauja iš anksto apibrėžti sąlyčių tipų žodžių sąrašų pavidalu ir išmoko apribojimus, kuriuos turi patenkinti nepriklausomi žodžių įterpimai automatiškai iš žodžių apibrėžimų. Konkrečiai mes išmokome koduotoją sukurti silpną įdėto žodžio versiją taip, kad ji (a) išlaikytų iš anksto parengto žodžio įdėjimo semantiką, (b) sutinka su nešališku žodžio apibrėžimu pagal žodyną ir (c) išlieka ortogonali vektoriaus erdvei, kurią apima visi iš anksto parengti žodžio įdėjimo elementai. Eksperimentiniai standartinių lyginamųjų duomenų rinkinių rezultatai rodo, kad siūlomas metodas gali tiksliai pašalinti nesąžiningus sąlyčius, koduotus iš anksto parengtuose žodžių įterpimuose, kartu išsaugodamas naudingą semantiką.', 'mk': 'Вклучувањето на зборови обучено на големи тела покажа дека кодираат високи нивоа на нефер дискриминаторен пол, расни, религиозни и етнички предрасуди. За разлика од тоа, човечките речници ги опишуваат значењата на зборовите на кратен, објективен и непристрасен начин. Предложуваме метод за дебизација на вградени зборови користејќи речници, без да бараме пристап до оригиналните ресурси за обука или било кое знаење во врска со зборот вградени алгоритми кои се користат. За разлика од претходната работа, нашиот предложен метод не бара типовите на преддефинирани предрасуди да бидат преддефинирани во форма на листи на зборови, и ги научи ограничувањата кои мора да бидат задоволни со непредрасудени вградувања на зборови автоматски од дефинирањата на зборовите. Specifically, we learn an encoder to generate a debiased version of an input word embedding such that it (a) retains the semantics of the pre-trained word embedding, (b) agrees with the unbiased definition of the word according to the dictionary, and (c) remains orthogonal to the vector space spanned by any biased basis vectors in the pre-trained word embedding space.  Experimental results on standard benchmark datasets show that the proposed method can accurately remove unfair biases encoded in pre-trained word embeddings, while preserving useful semantics.', 'kk': 'Үлкен корпорада оқылған сөздерді ендіру үлкен деңгейлері дұрыс дискриминациялық гендер, рас, діниен және этниялық тәртіптердің жоғары деңгейлерін кодтады. Әйтпесе, адамдар жазылған сөздер сөздердің маңызды сөздердің маңызды, мақсатты және тәуелді түрде сипаттайды. Біз сөздерді сөздерді қолдану арқылы, бастапқы оқыту ресурстарына қатынау немесе қолданылатын сөздерді ендіру алгоритмдеріне қатынау керек болмаса, алгоритмдерді дебияциялау арқылы ұсындық. Алдыңғы жұмыс әдісімізге сәйкес келмейді, сөздер тізімінде алдыңғы түрлерді алдыңғы түрлеріне анықтау керек емес және сөздердің анықтамасынан автоматты түрде қолдану керек сөздердің шектерін біледі. Ескерту үшін, біз кодерді ендірген келтірілген сөздің дебияцияланған нұсқасын үйренеміз, бұл (a) алдындағы келтірілген сөзді ендіру симантикасын сақтайды, b) сөздің сөзді сөздігіне сәйкес келтірілмеген анықтамасына сәйкес келеді, және c) кез- келген кез- келген негізгі векторлар алды Стандартты белгілер деректер қорларының эксперименталық нәтижелері келтірілген әдістердің алдын- оқылған сөздерді ендіру үшін, пайдалы семантикаларды сақтау үшін, қолданылған әдістерді дұрыс өшіру', 'ml': 'വലിയ കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. നീതിയില്ലാത്ത വ്യത്യാസവിഭാഗങ്ങള മറിച്ച്, മനുഷ്യരുടെ എഴുതിയ നിഘണ്ടാക്കള്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ അര്\u200dത്ഥങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു കോണിസിസ്റ്റ്, ലക്ഷ്യത് നിഘണ്ടീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് മുമ്പ് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകള്\u200d തെറ്റാക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു രീതി വാക്കുകളുടെ പട്ടികയുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d മുമ്പ് നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെടാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മാര്\u200dഗ്ഗങ്ങള്\u200d ആവശ്യമില്ല, വാക്കുകളുടെ ലിസ്റ്റില്\u200d നിന്നും വാ Specifically, we learn an encoder to generate a debiased version of an input word embedding such that it (a) retains the semantics of the pre-trained word embedding, (b) agrees with the unbiased definition of the word according to the dictionary, and (c) remains orthogonal to the vector space spanned by any biased basis vectors in the pre-trained word embedding space.  സാധാരണ ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയില്\u200d നീതിയില്ലാത്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200d മ', 'ms': 'Pencampuran perkataan dilatih pada korpra besar telah menunjukkan untuk mengekodkan tahap tinggi jenis diskriminasi yang tidak adil, rasial, agama dan etnik biases. Sebaliknya, kamus ditulis manusia menggambarkan makna perkataan dalam cara yang singkat, objektif dan tidak bias. Kami cadangkan kaedah untuk debasing penyembedding perkataan terlatih sebelum menggunakan kamus, tanpa memerlukan akses kepada sumber latihan asal atau sebarang pengetahuan mengenai algoritma penyembedding perkataan yang digunakan. Tidak seperti kerja sebelumnya, kaedah kami yang direncanakan tidak memerlukan jenis bias untuk ditakrif-depan dalam bentuk senarai kata, dan mempelajari halangan yang mesti dipenuhi oleh penyelesaian perkataan tidak bias secara automatik dari definisi kamus perkataan. Secara khusus, kita belajar pengekod untuk menghasilkan versi debiased perkataan input yang memasukkan supaya ia (a) menyimpan semantik penyembedding perkataan pra-dilatih, (b) bersetuju dengan definisi tidak biased perkataan menurut kamus, dan (c) tetap ortogonal ke ruang vektor yang dijangka oleh mana-mana vektor asas biased dalam ruang penyembedding perkataan pra-dilatih. Keputusan percubaan pada set data tanda rujukan piawai menunjukkan bahawa kaedah yang diusulkan boleh hapuskan tepat bias yang tidak adil yang dikodifikasikan dalam penyambungan perkataan terlatih-terlatih, sementara menyimpan semantik berguna.', 'mt': 'L-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem imħarrġa fuq korpora kbira wriet li tikkodifika livelli għoljin ta’ preġudizzji diskriminatorji inġusti bejn is-sessi, ir-razza, ir-reliġjon u l-etnija. B’kuntrast, id-dikjararji miktuba mill-bniedem jiddeskrivu t-tifsiriet tal-kliem b’mod konċiż, oġġettiv u bla preġudizzju. Aħna nipproponu metodu għad-debizzar tal-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem imħarrġa minn qabel bl-użu tad-dikjaraturi, mingħajr ma nħtieġu a ċċess għar-riżorsi oriġinali tat-taħriġ jew kwalunkwe għarfien dwar il-kliem algoritmi tal-inkorporazzjoni użati. Għall-kuntrarju tax-xogħol pre ċedenti, il-metodu propost tagħna ma jeħtieġx li t-tipi ta’ preġudizzji jiġu definiti minn qabel fil-forma ta’ listi tal-kelmiet, u jitgħallem ir-restrizzjonijiet li jridu jiġu sodisfatti permezz ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet mhux preġudizzjati tal-kelmiet awtomatikament mid-definizzjonijiet tad-dikjaratorji tal-kelmiet. B’mod speċifiku, qed nitgħallmu kodifikatur biex jiġġenera verżjoni debitata ta’ kelma ta’ input li tinkorpora b’tali mod li (a) iżżomm is-semantika ta’ l-inkorporazzjoni tal-kelma mħarrġa minn qabel, (b) jaqbel mad-definizzjoni bla pre ġudizzju tal-kelma skond id-dikjararju, u (c) jibqa’ ortogonali għall-ispazju tal-vettur li jgħaddi minn kwalunkwe vettur ta’ b a żi biased fl-ispazju ta’ inkorporazzjoni tal-kelma mħarrġa minn qabel. Riżultati esperimentali dwar settijiet ta’ dejta standard ta’ parametri referenzjarji juru li l-metodu propost jista’ jneħħi b’mod pre ċiż il-preġudizzji in ġusti kkodifikati f’inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem imħarrġa minn qabel, filwaqt li jippreserva semantika utli.', 'mn': 'Маш их корпоратын сургалтын үгнүүд нь үнэндээ бус хүн, урсгалын, шашин шүтлэг, үндэсний харилцааны өндөр хэмжээсүүдийг дүрслэж байна. Харамсалтай нь, хүний бичсэн үг үгийг тодорхойлолтой, зорилготой, эсрэг байдлаар тайлбарладаг. Бид алгоритмыг ашиглаж сургалтын өмнө сургалтын үгийг нэвтрүүлэх арга зааж өгдөг. Өмнөх ажлын эсрэг, бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн арга нь үгийн жагсаалтын хэлбэрээр аль хэдийн тодорхойлж чадахгүй, мөн үгийн тодорхойлж чадахгүй үгийг автоматаар хангалтгүй хэмжээсүүдийг суралцдаг. Тодорхой хэлбэл, бид коддогчийг бий болгох хэлбэрийг суралцаж суралцаж суралцаж байлаа. Энэ нь (a) урд сургалтын үгнээс хадгалагдаж, b) үгнээс илэрхийлэгдэхгүй тодорхойлолтой тодорхойлолтой байдаг. c) нь урд сургалтын аль ч бага сургалтын векторууд хадгалагдаж байна. Стандарт банкмарк өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын үр дүн нь тайлбарласан арга нь өмнө сургалтын үгнээс шинэчлэгдсэн буруу байдлыг шууд хадгалах боломжтой гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'Wkłady słów szkolone na dużych korpusach wykazały, że kodują wysoki poziom niesprawiedliwych dyskryminujących płci, rasowych, religijnych i etnicznych uprzedzeń. Natomiast słowniki napisane przez człowieka opisują znaczenia słów w zwięzły, obiektywny i bezstronny sposób. Proponujemy metodę debiazowania wstępnie przeszkolonych osadzeń słów za pomocą słowników, bez konieczności dostępu do oryginalnych zasobów szkoleniowych ani żadnej wiedzy dotyczącej zastosowanych algorytmów osadzania słów. W przeciwieństwie do poprzednich prac, proponowana przez nas metoda nie wymaga wstępnego zdefiniowania typów uprzedzeń w postaci list słów i automatycznie uczy się ograniczeń, które muszą być spełnione przez bezstronne osadzenie słów z definicji słowników. W szczególności uczymy się kodera, aby generować obiektywną wersję osadzania słowa wejściowego w taki sposób, że (a) zachowuje semantykę wstępnie przeszkolonego osadzania słowa, (b) zgadza się z bezstronną definicją słowa zgodnie z słownikiem, a (c) pozostaje prostokątne do przestrzeni wektorowej rozpiętej przez dowolne stronnicze wektory bazowe w przestrzeni osadzania słowa wstępnie przeszkolonej. Wyniki eksperymentalne na standardowych zestawach danych referencyjnych pokazują, że proponowana metoda może dokładnie usunąć nieuczciwe uprzedzenia zakodowane we wstępnie przeszkolonych osadzeniach słów, przy jednoczesnym zachowaniu użytecznej semantyki.', 'no': 'Ordinnbyggingar som trengte på stor korpora har vist å kode høge nivåar av ugyldige diskriminasjon av seks, rask, religisk og etnisk forskjeller. I contrast, menneskeskrivne ordbokstavar skildrar betydningane av ord på eit konkis, objekt og eit ugjennomsiktig måte. Vi foreslår ein metode for debiasing av føretrained ordinnbygging med ordbokar, utan å kreve tilgang til den opprinnelige øvingsressursen eller nokon kjenning om ordinnbyggingsalgoritmen som vert brukt. I motsetjing til førre arbeid krev vårt foreslått metode ikkje kva typar førehandsvising som skal definerast i form av ordlister, og lærer avgrensingar som må vera tilfredsstillende av ikkje-førehandsvising av ord automatisk frå orddefinisjonane av ordlister. Spesielt lærer vi eit koder for å laga ein debiased versjon av eit inndataord innebygd slik at det (a) beholder semantikkane til den først trengte ordinnbygginga, b) er samsvar med den ugjennomsiktige definisjonen av ordet etter ordboka, og c) forblir orthogonal til vektorrommet avbygd av alle forelærte bakgrunnvektorane i det først trengte ordinnbyggingsrommet. Eksperimentale resultat på standardsetata for benchmarken viser at den foreslåde metoden kan nøyaktig fjerna ugyldige forsikringar kodert i føretrainerte ordinnbygging, medan det er lagra nyttige semantikk.', 'ro': 'Încorporările de cuvinte instruite asupra corporelor mari au arătat că codifică niveluri ridicate de prejudecăți nedrepte discriminatorii de gen, rasiale, religioase și etnice. În schimb, dicționarele scrise de om descriu semnificațiile cuvintelor într-o manieră concisă, obiectivă și imparțială. Propunem o metodă de debiasare a încorporărilor de cuvinte pre-instruite folosind dicționare, fără a necesita accesul la resursele de instruire originale sau orice cunoștințe cu privire la algoritmii de încorporare de cuvinte utilizați. Spre deosebire de lucrările anterioare, metoda noastră propusă nu necesită ca tipurile de prejudecăți să fie predefinite sub formă de liste de cuvinte și învață constrângerile care trebuie îndeplinite prin încorporarea imparțială a cuvintelor în mod automat din definițiile dicționare ale cuvintelor. În mod specific, învățăm un encoder pentru a genera o versiune debiased a unui cuvânt de intrare încorporat astfel încât (a) să păstreze semantica încorporării cuvântului pre-instruit, (b) să fie de acord cu definiția imparțială a cuvântului conform dicționarului și (c) să rămână ortogonală la spațiul vectorial acoperit de orice vectori de bază părtiniți în spațiul pre-instruit de încorporare cuvânt. Rezultatele experimentale asupra seturilor de date standard de referință arată că metoda propusă poate elimina cu precizie prejudecățile incorecte codificate în încorporarea de cuvinte pre-instruite, păstrând în același timp semantica utilă.', 'si': 'Word Embdings Trained on Large Corpolar have seen to code high levels of unfair discrdiscrdiscrdiscrminator sex, racial, faithfulness and etnique beases. විරුද්ධයෙන්, මිනිස්සු ලියපු ලියපු භාෂාවක් වචන වචන වර්තනයක් පැහැදිලි කරනවා වචන වර්තනයක්, අක්ෂාව අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා වචනයක් භාවිත කරන්න, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති විදියට ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් න මුලින් වැඩ වගේම, අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විධානය අනුවෙන් වචන ලැයිස්තුවක් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විධානය කරන්න අවශ්\u200dය නැහැ, සහ වචන ලැයිස්තුවක් වලින @ item: inlistbox ප්\u200dරමාණය බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට්ටුවට පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරය විදියට අවාධික ප්\u200d', 'so': 'Word embeddings trained on large corpora have shown to encode high levels of unfair discriminatory gender, racial, religious and ethnic biases.  Kaniisadaha qoran ee biniaadamka waxay ku qoran yihiin micnihiisa hadallada oo ku qoran xaajooyin, goal iyo mid a an la khilaafan. Waxaannu soo jeedaynaa qaab uu ku baaraandegayo hadal ku qoran afka hore oo lagu isticmaalayo luqadaha, oo aan u baahnayn inaad hesho hantidii asalka ah ama aqoon ku saabsan hadalka ku qoran algorithm isticmaalaya. Shaqo horay oo aan ka mid ahayn, qaababkayaga la soo jeeday uma baahno noocyada khiyaanada ah in horay loo sii caddeeyo foomka qoraalka erayada, waxayna barto qasabka waajibka ah in lagu raalli karo hadalka aan caqliga aheyn si automatic ah uga soo diro qoraalka erayada. Si gaar ah, waxaynu barnaa qoraal qodi ah oo uu u sameeyo qoraal qalloocan oo ereyga ku qoran (a) inuu haysto semantics of ereyga ka horreeyey oo ku qoran, (b) wuxuu ku heshiiyaa aqoonsiga a an la beddelin erayga sida dictionaadda u waafaqsan, iyo (c) waxaynu ku hadhaa habboon xafiiska vectorka oo ku dhashay waddooyinka ka horeysan oo ku qoran hadalka ku qoran. Imtixaanka ku saabsan taariikhda standard benchmark databases waxay muujinayaan in qaabkii la soo jeeday uu si saxda ah u dhaqaajin karo qalloocyada aan xaq ahayn oo lagu qoray qoraalka ka horeeyey, marka la ilaaliyo semantika faa’iidada ah.', 'sv': 'Ordinbäddningar utbildade på stora corpora har visat sig koda höga nivåer av orättvisa diskriminerande kön, ras, religiösa och etniska fördomar. Däremot beskriver människoskrivna ordböcker betydelsen av ord på ett koncist, objektivt och opartiskt sätt. Vi föreslår en metod för debiasing av förklädda ord med hjälp av ordböcker, utan att kräva tillgång till de ursprungliga utbildningsresurserna eller någon kunskap om ordet inbäddningsalgoritmer som används. Till skillnad från tidigare arbete kräver vår föreslagna metod inte att typerna av fördomar definieras i form av ordlistor, och lär sig de begränsningar som måste uppfyllas av opartiska ord inbäddningar automatiskt från ordordsdefinitioner. Specifikt lär vi oss en kodare för att generera en debiased version av ett inmatningsord inbäddning så att den (a) behåller semantiken för den förintränade ordet inbäddning, (b) överensstämmer med den opartiska definitionen av ordet enligt ordlistan, och (c) förblir ortogonal mot vektorutrymmet som spänns över eventuella partiska basvektorer i det förintränade ordet inbäddningsutrymmet. Experimentella resultat på standarddatauppsättningar visar att den föreslagna metoden på ett korrekt sätt kan ta bort orättvisa fördomar kodade i förklädda ordinbäddningar, samtidigt som användbar semantik bevaras.', 'sr': 'Prikazivanje riječi obučenih na velikoj korpori pokazalo je da kodiraju visoke nivoe nepravednih diskriminacijskih spola, rasnih, religioznih i etničkih predrasuda. Za razliku od toga, ljudski pisani reči opisuju značenje riječi na konkretnom, objektivnom i nepristrasnom naèinu. Predlažemo metodu za debijaciju predobučenih reèi, koristeći reèi, bez zahteva pristupa originalnim sredstvima obuke ili bilo kakvim znanjem o reèi ukljuèujuæi algoritme. Za razliku od prethodnog rada, naša predložena metoda ne zahteva da se vrste predrasude predodređuju u obliku listi riječi i uči ograničenja koje moraju biti zadovoljene nepristrasnim riječima koje automatski uključuju iz definicija reči reči. Posebno, naučimo kodera da stvori debijazovanu verziju unutarnje reči koja uključuje, tako da (a) zadržava semantiku predobučene reči uključujući, b) se slaže sa nepristrasnom definicijom reči u skladu s rečnikom, a (c) ostaje orthogonalno prema vektorskom prostoru koja se širi svaki predrasuden vektori u predobučenom prostoru uključujući riječ. Eksperimentalni rezultati na standardnim bazama podataka pokazuju da predloženi metod može precizno ukloniti nepravedne predrasude kodirane u predobučenim rečima, dok čuva korisne semantike.', 'ta': 'பெரிய நிறுவனத்தில் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட வார்த்தை குறிப்பிட்டுள்ளது அதிக நீதமான வித்தியாசமான பெண், குழந்தைகள், மார்க் மாறுபட்டால், மனித எழுத்தப்பட்ட அகராதிகள் ஒரு கூட்டத்திற்கு, பொருள் மற்றும் ஒரு பொருள் மற்றும் பொருட்படாத வகையில் வ நாங்கள் முன் பயிற்சி முன் பயிற்சி சொல்லும் பொருட்களை பயன்படுத்தி பிழைகாணும் முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், மூல பயிற்சி மூலம் அல் @ info குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் ஒரு குறியீட்டாக்கி பிழையாக்கப்பட்ட ஒரு உள்ளீட்டு சொல்லின் பதிப்பை உருவாக்க கற்றுக்கொள்கிறோம் அது (a) முன் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட வார்த்தை குறியீட்டில் உள்ளிடும் பொருளின் semantics வைத்துக் கொ நிலையான பெங்க்மார்க் தரவுத்தளங்களில் சோதனையின் முடிவு', 'ur': 'بڑے جسم پر آموزش کی کلمات کی آموزش کی گئی ہے کہ انصاف جنس، نژادی، دین اور قومی غرض کے بلند سطح کو دکھائے جاتے ہیں. مختلف، انسان کے لکھے لکھے ہوئے لکھے لکھے ہوئے لکھے ہوئے لکھوں کا مطلب ایک دھوپ، موضوع اور غلط طریقے سے بیان کرتے ہیں۔ ہم ایک طریقہ پیش آموزش کی کلمات ابڈینگ کے لئے پیش آموزش دینے کے لئے پیش آموزش دینے کے لئے پیش آموزش دیتے ہیں، باتوں کے مطابق، اصلی تدریس رسورسوں کی دسترسی کے بغیر اور کسی علم کے بارے میں جو کلمات ابڈینگ الگوریتم کے بارے پہلے کے کام کے مطابق، ہماری پیشنهاد کی طریقے کی مختلف بات لکھوں کی طرح سے پہلے پڑھنے کی ضرورت نہیں ہے، اور وہ محدودیت کی تعلیم کرتا ہے جو کلمات کی تعریف سے آزاد ہونے کی ضرورت نہیں ہے۔ ہم ایک کوڈر کو سیکھتے ہیں کہ ایک اینٹ ورڈ کی ایک ڈبی ویرجن پیدا کرے جس طرح یہ (a) پیش آموزش کی لفظ کے سیمانٹیکوں کو جمع کرے، اور (b) لفظ کے مطابق لفظ کی غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غ استاندارڈ بنچم مارک ڈاٹ سٹ پر تجربہ کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ پیش آموزش کی کلمات میں قائم ہونے والی غلطی غلطی غلطی کو دقیق دور کر سکتا ہے اور مفید سیمانٹیکوں کی حفاظت کرتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Buyuk kompaniyada o'rganilgan so'zlar taʼminlovchi so'zlar juda ko'p g'alar, ranglar, диний ва миллат бўйича ўзгаришларни kodlash imkoniyatini ko'rsatadi. Ko'rinishida, inson yozuvchi lugʻatlar bir xil, obʼekt va o'xshash usulda so'zlarning ma'nosini aytadi. Biz oldin taʼminlovchi so'zlarni ishlatishdan oldin so'zlardan foydalanish usulini taʼminlovchi qilamiz, asl taʼminlovchi manbalarni yoki ishlatilgan algoritlarga ruxsat yoʻq. Birinchi ishni o'zgartirib boʻlmasa, yaxshiroqchi usul soʻzlar roʻyxatidagi avtomatik aniqlash kerak emas, va o'z soʻzlar roʻyxatida hech qanday bog'lanmagan so'zlar taʼriflaridan avtomatik o'rganadi. Kodlash mumkin, biz bir kodlash usulini yaratish uchun o'rganamiz. Bu so'zning oldin o'rganilgan so'zning semantikasi (b) lugʻatga ega boʻlmagan so'zni qisqarish va (c) o'qishdan oldin o'rgangan so'zning qisqartmalaridan hech qanday qanday qisqaruvchi vektorega ega bo'lgan. Name", 'vi': 'Những từ ngữ được đào tạo trên tập đoàn lớn đã cho thấy mã hóa mức độ cao của giới tính bất công, phân biệt chủng tộc, tôn giáo và dân tộc. Ngược lại, từ điển viết trên người miêu tả ý nghĩa của từ ngữ theo một cách ngắn gọn, mục tiêu và không ràng buộc. Chúng tôi đề xuất phương pháp thao túng từ ngữ được đào tạo, sử dụng từ điển, mà không cần phải truy cập vào nguồn lực đào tạo gốc hay kiến thức gì về thuật to án tổ chức từ được dùng. Không giống những tác dụng trước, phương pháp của chúng ta không yêu cầu các kiểu giả lập được định nghĩa trước dưới dạng các danh sách từ, và học các giới hạn phải được đáp ứng bởi những từ ngữ được thao túng tự động từ định nghĩa từ điển của các từ. Cụ thể, chúng ta học được một b ộ mã hóa để tạo ra một phiên bản chứa chữ nhập c ó tính thiếu chính thức để nó giữ được chữ thuật của những từ ngữ được huấn luyện trước, B) đồng ý với định nghĩa đơn giản của từ theo từ điển, và c) luôn luôn thẳng thắn với khoảng cách vector trong vùng chứa chữ được huấn luyện trước. Kết quả thí nghiệm trên các bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn cho thấy rằng phương pháp được đề nghị có thể xóa bỏ các sai sót được mã hóa trong sự tác nghiệp từ được huấn luyện trước, trong khi giữ ngữ pháp hữu ích.', 'bg': 'Вградените думи, обучени върху големи корпуси, показват, че кодират високи нива на несправедливи дискриминационни полови, расови, религиозни и етнически пристрастия. За разлика от това, написаните от човека речници описват значението на думите по кратък, обективен и безпристрастен начин. Предлагаме метод за дебиализиране на предварително обучени вграждания на думи с помощта на речници, без да се изисква достъп до оригиналните учебни ресурси или познания относно използваните алгоритми за вграждане на думи. За разлика от предишната работа, предложеният ни метод не изисква видовете пристрастия да бъдат предварително дефинирани под формата на списъци с думи и научава ограниченията, които трябва да бъдат удовлетворени от безпристрастно вграждане на думи автоматично от определенията на речниците на думите. По-конкретно, научаваме кодер да генерира дебиазирана версия на вградена дума така, че (а) да запази семантиката на предварително обучената дума за вграждане, (б) да е съгласен с безпристрастната дефиниция на думата според речника и (в) да остане правоъгълен на векторното пространство, обхванато от всякакви предубедени основни вектори в предварително обученото пространство за вграждане на думи. Експерименталните резултати на стандартните сравнителни набори от данни показват, че предложеният метод може точно да премахне несправедливите отклонения, кодирани в предварително обучени вграждания на думи, като същевременно запазва полезната семантика.', 'nl': 'Woordinbeddingen opgeleid op grote corpora hebben aangetoond dat ze hoge niveaus van oneerlijke discriminerende gender-, raciale, religieuze en etnische vooroordelen coderen. Daarentegen beschrijven menselijke woordenboeken de betekenissen van woorden op een beknopte, objectieve en onpartijdige manier. We stellen een methode voor voor het debiasen van vooraf getrainde woord embeddings met behulp van woordenboeken, zonder toegang tot de originele trainingsbronnen of enige kennis met betrekking tot de gebruikte woord embedding algoritmes. In tegenstelling tot eerder werk vereist onze voorgestelde methode niet dat de soorten vooroordelen vooraf gedefinieerd moeten worden in de vorm van woordenlijsten, en leert de beperkingen waaraan moet worden voldaan door onbevooroordeelde woordinsluitingen automatisch uit woordenboek definities van de woorden. Specifiek leren we een encoder om een gedebiased versie van een input woord embedding te genereren, zodat het (a) de semantiek van het vooraf getrainde woord embedding behoudt, (b) overeenkomt met de onbevooroordeelde definitie van het woord volgens het woordenboek, en (c) orthogonaal blijft ten opzichte van de vectorruimte die wordt overspannen door een biased basisvectorvector in de voorgetrainde woord embedding ruimte. Experimentele resultaten op standaard benchmark datasets tonen aan dat de voorgestelde methode oneerlijke vooroordelen kan verwijderen die zijn gecodeerd in vooraf getrainde woordembeddingen, terwijl nuttige semantiek behouden blijft.', 'da': 'Ordindlejringer trænet på store korpora har vist sig at kode høje niveauer af uretfærdig diskriminerende køn, race, religiøse og etniske fordomme. I modsætning hertil beskriver menneskeskrevne ordbøger betydningen af ord på en kortfattet, objektiv og upartisk måde. Vi foreslår en metode til debiasing af præ-trænede ord indlejringer ved hjælp af ordbøger, uden at kræve adgang til de oprindelige træningsressourcer eller nogen viden om ordet indlejring algoritmer anvendt. I modsætning til tidligere arbejde kræver vores foreslåede metode ikke, at typerne af fordomme skal være foruddefineret i form af ordlister, og lærer de begrænsninger, der skal opfyldes ved upartiske ord indlejringer automatisk fra ordbogsdefinitioner af ordene. Specielt lærer vi en encoder at generere en debiased version af et input ord indlejring således, at den (a) bevarer semantikken af den prætrænede ord indlejring, (b) er enig med den upartiske definition af ordet i henhold til ordbogen, og (c) forbliver ortogonal i forhold til vektorrummet spændt af eventuelle fordomsbaserede grundvektorer i det prætrænede ord indlejring rum. Eksperimentelle resultater på standard benchmark datasæt viser, at den foreslåede metode nøjagtigt kan fjerne uretfærdige skævheder kodet i præ-trænede ordindlejringer, samtidig med at nyttig semantik bevares.', 'hr': 'Prikazivanje riječi obučenih na velikom tijelu pokazalo je da kodiraju visoke razine nepravednih diskriminacijskih spola, rasnih, religioznih i etničkih predrasuda. Za suprotno, ljudski pisani riječi opisuju značenje riječi na konkretnom, objektivnom i nepristrasnom načinu. Predlažemo metodu za debijairanje predobučenih riječi uključujući riječi s riječima, bez zahtjeva pristupa originalnim izvorima obuke ili bilo kakvim znanjima u vezi reči uključujući algoritme. Za razliku od prethodnog rada, naša predložena metoda ne zahtijeva da se vrste predrasude predodređuju u obliku listi riječi i uči ograničenja koje moraju biti zadovoljene nepristrasnim riječima koje automatski uključuju iz definicija riječi riječi. Posebno, naučili smo koder da stvori debijaznu verziju unutarnje riječi uključujući tako da (a) zadrži semantiku predobučene riječi uključujući, b) se slaže s nepristrasnom definicijom riječi u skladu s riječi riječi, a (c) ostaje ortogonalno prema vektorskom prostoru spajanom od bilo kojih predrasudenih vektori u predobučenom prostoru uključujući riječ. Eksperimentalni rezultati na standardnim podacima o referenciji pokazuju da predložena metoda može precizno ukloniti nepravedne predrasude kodirane u predobučenim uvođenim riječima, dok čuva korisne semantike.', 'ko': '대형 어료 라이브러리에 훈련된 단어는 높은 수준의 불공평한 차별적 성별, 인종, 종교, 민족 편견을 보여 준다.그에 비해 인류가 쓴 사전은 간결하고 객관적이며 공정한 방식으로 단어의 의미를 묘사한다.우리는 사전을 사용하여 미리 훈련된 단어 삽입을 차용하는 방법을 제시했다. 원시 훈련 자원이나 사용된 단어 삽입 알고리즘에 대한 지식을 방문할 필요가 없다.이전의 작업과 달리 우리가 제시한 방법은 단어 목록의 형식으로 편견의 유형을 미리 정의할 필요가 없고 단어의 사전 정의에서 편견이 없는 단어가 반드시 만족해야 하는 제약을 자동으로 배울 수 있다.구체적으로 말하자면, 우리는 입력 단어가 삽입된 Debiase 버전을 만드는 인코더를 배웠다. 이로써 (a)는 미리 훈련된 단어가 삽입된 의미를 보존하고 (b) 사전에 있는 단어의 편향된 정의에 부합되며, (c) 미리 훈련된 단어가 삽입된 공간에서 편향된 벡터가 뛰어넘는 벡터 공간과 정교함을 유지한다.표준 기준 데이터 집합에서의 실험 결과에 따르면 이 방법은 예비 훈련 단어에 인코딩된 불공평한 편견을 정확하게 제거하고 유용한 의미를 보존할 수 있다.', 'de': 'Worteinbettungen, die auf großen Korpora trainiert wurden, haben gezeigt, dass sie ein hohes Maß an unfairen diskriminierenden geschlechtsspezifischen, rassischen, religiösen und ethnischen Vorurteilen kodieren. Im Gegensatz dazu beschreiben menschlich geschriebene Wörterbücher die Bedeutungen von Wörtern prägnant, objektiv und unvoreingenommen. Wir schlagen eine Methode vor, um vorgetrainierte Worteinbettungen mithilfe von Wörterbüchern zu debiasen, ohne Zugriff auf die ursprünglichen Schulungsressourcen oder Kenntnisse über die verwendeten Worteinbettungsalgorithmen zu benötigen. Im Gegensatz zu früheren Arbeiten erfordert unsere vorgeschlagene Methode nicht, dass die Arten von Verzerrungen in Form von Wortlisten vordefiniert werden müssen, und lernt die Einschränkungen, die durch unvoreingenommene Worteinbettungen erfüllt werden müssen, automatisch aus Wörterbuchdefinitionen der Wörter. Insbesondere lernen wir einen Encoder, eine debiazed Version einer Eingabeworteinbettung zu generieren, so dass (a) die Semantik der vorgetrainierten Worteinbettung beibehält, (b) mit der unvoreingenommenen Definition des Wortes gemäß dem Wörterbuch übereinstimmt und (c) orthogonal zu dem Vektorraum bleibt, der von beliebigen verzerrten Basisvektoren im vorgetrainierten Worteinbettungsraum überspannt wird. Experimentelle Ergebnisse an Standard-Benchmark-Datensätzen zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagene Methode unfaire Verzerrungen, die in vortrainierten Wort-Einbettungen kodiert sind, präzise beseitigen kann, während nützliche Semantik beibehalten wird.', 'id': 'Pencampuran kata-kata dilatih pada korpra besar telah menunjukkan untuk mengkode tingkat tinggi jenis diskriminasi yang tidak adil, rasial, agama dan etnis biases. Sebaliknya, kamus ditulis manusia menggambarkan arti kata dalam cara singkat, objektif dan tidak bias. Kami mengusulkan metode untuk debasing pembangunan kata-kata yang dilatih-dilatih menggunakan kamus, tanpa membutuhkan akses ke sumber latihan asli atau pengetahuan apapun mengenai kata-kata pembangunan algoritma yang digunakan. Tidak seperti pekerjaan sebelumnya, metode kami yang diusulkan tidak memerlukan jenis biases untuk didefinisikan sebelumnya dalam bentuk daftar kata, dan mempelajari batas yang harus dipenuhi oleh pembangunan kata tidak bias secara otomatis dari definisi kata-kata kata. Secara spesifik, kita belajar pengekode untuk menghasilkan versi debiased kata input embedding sehingga (a) menyimpan semantik dari pre-trained word embedding, (b) setuju dengan definisi tidak biased kata menurut kamus, dan (c) tetap ortogonal ke ruang vektor yang ditambah oleh setiap vektor dasar biased dalam pre-trained word embedding space. Hasil eksperimental pada set data benchmark standar menunjukkan bahwa metode yang diusulkan dapat dengan akurat menghapuskan biases yang tidak adil terkodifikasi dalam penyambungan kata-kata yang terlatih sebelumnya, sementara mempertahankan semantik berguna.', 'fa': 'آموزش آموزش کلمات در شرکت بزرگ نشان داده است که سطح بالا از جنس جدایی بی عدالت، نژادی، مذهبی و اقوام تغییر دهند. بر خلاف این، لغوی\u200cهای انسان نوشته شده\u200cاند، معنی\u200cهای کلمات را به یک طریق مشخص، هدف و بی\u200cنظیر توصیف می\u200cکنند. ما یک روش پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که با استفاده از الگوریتم\u200cهای پیش آموزش کلمات را از طریق استفاده کنیم، بدون نیازی به دسترسی به منابع آموزش اصلی یا هیچ دانشی در مورد کلمات ابتدایی الگوریتم\u200cهای استفاده می\u200cشود. برخلاف کار پیش از این، روش پیشنهاد ما نیازی ندارد که نوع پیشنهاد را در شکل فهرست کلمات پیشنهاد تعریف کنند، و محدودیت را یاد کند که باید توسط کلمات غیرقابل تشکیل شود، به طور خودکار از تعریف\u200cهای کلمات کلمات را به طور کامل از تعریف دهنده\u200cها راضی شود. به طور خاصی، ما یک رمز\u200cدهنده را یاد می\u200cگیریم تا نسخه\u200cای از کلمه وارد شدن را تولید کند که (a) semantics of the pre-trained word embedding (b) با تعریف غیرقابل توجه به کلمه بر اساس کلمه\u200cنامه موافقت می\u200cکند، و (c) به فضای ویکتوری که توسط هر ویکتوری\u200cهای پایه\u200cهای پیش\u200cآموز در فضای وارد شدن کلمه\u200cهای پیش\u200cآموزش می\u200cباشد، مت نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای استاندارد استاندارد نشان می\u200cدهد که روش پیشنهاد می\u200cتواند دقیقاً حذف\u200cکننده\u200cهای بی\u200cعدالتی را که در ابتدایی کلمه\u200cهای پیش آموزش شده\u200cاند، در حالی که حفاظت از سنتانیک\u200cهای', 'af': "Woord inbêding wat op groot korpora opgelei is, het vertoon om hoë vlakke van ongeregtige diskriminasie geneem, rasiese, reliëese en etniske voorskrifte te kodeer. In contrast, mens-skryfde woordeboeke beskrywe die betekenings van woorde in 'n konkis, objektief en 'n onbiasiese manier. Ons voorstel 'n metode vir debiasing van vooraf opgelei woord inbêding met woordeboekvorms, sonder om toegang te verkry tot die oorspronklike onderwerking hulpbronne of enige kennis aangaande die woord inbêring algoritme wat gebruik word. Ongelyks soos vooraf werk, ons voorgestelde metode benodig nie die tipes vooraf-gedefinieerd word in die vorm van woorde lyste nie, en leer die beheinings wat deur onbiasiese woord inbêring automaties versadig moet word van woordeboekdefinisies van die woorde te bevestig nie. Spesifieke, ons leer 'n enkoder om 'n debiased weergawe van' n invoer woord in te genereer sodat dit (a) die semantieke van die voorafgeleerde woord in b êer hou, b) ooreenstem met die onbiasiese definisie van die woord volgens die woordeboek, en c) bly orthogonaal na die vektor ruimte wat deur enige gewone basis vektore in die voorafgeleerde woord inbêer ruimte geplaas word. Eksperimentale resultate op standaard benchmark datastel vertoon dat die voorgestelde metode kan presies verwyder ongeregtige voorskrifte wat in voorafgevorderde woord inbêding gekodeer is, terwyl gebruiklike semantieke bewaar word.", 'sw': 'Matambo yaliyofundishwa kwenye makampuni makubwa yameonyesha kuonesha kiwango kikubwa cha ubaguzi wa rangi, rangi, dini na makabila bila bila haki. Tofauti na hilo, lugha za kuandikwa kwa binadamu zinaelezea maana ya maneno kwa utata, lengo na namna isiyo na upendeleo. Tunazipendekeza njia ya kudanganya maneno yanayotumia lugha za kiimla, bila kudai kupata rasilimali za msingi za mafunzo au ufahamu wowote kuhusu neno linalojumuisha lugha zilizotumika. Tofauti na kazi za kabla, mbinu yetu inayopendekezwa hazihitaji aina ya upendeleo wa kutafsiriwa kabla katika aina ya orodha ya maneno, na kujifunza vikwazo ambavyo lazima kuridhishwa na maneno yasiyo ya kibaguzi kutoka kwenye ufafanuzi wa lugha ya maneno. Kwa ujumla, tunajifunza kodi ya kutengeneza toleo la neno la injini lililozungumzia kama vile (a) linabaki mifano ya neno lililofunzwa kabla, (b) anakubaliana na ufafanuzi wa neno lisilo sahihi kwa mujibu wa dictiona, na (c) bado unabaki kwa upande mwingi wa nafasi ya vector iliyokuwa imetengenezwa na vectors yeyote anayeishi kwenye nafasi ya neno lililojifunza kabla. Matokeo ya majaribio juu ya taarifa za bendera zinaonyesha kwamba mbinu hiyo ya pendekezo inaweza kuondoa kwa sahihi upendeleo wa haki uliokuwa umewekwa katika mazingira ya maneno yaliyofunzwa kabla, wakati wa kuhifadhia dawa zinazofaa.', 'am': 'በታላቁ ኮርፖርት ላይ የተማሩት ቃላት የውስጥነት ግንኙነት፣ ዘረኝነት፣ የሃይማኖት እና የሕዝብ ብሔራዊ ተቃዋሚዎች ከፍተኛ ደረጃዎችን ለማድረግ ያሳያል፡፡ በተለይም፣ የሰው ጽሑፎች መዝገበኞች የቃላትን አካላት በአካባቢ፣ አካባቢ እና ያልተቃወመ ቋንቋ ይናገራሉ፡፡ የመጀመሪያው ትምህርት ሀብት ወይም ማንኛውም እውቀት በተጠቀም ቃላት መግለጫ ሳይያስፈልጋቸው ለቀድሞ የተማረከ ቃላት መግለጫ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ Unlike prior work, our proposed method does not require the types of biases to be pre-defined in the form of word lists, and learns the constraints that must be satisfied by unbiased word embeddings automatically from dictionary definitions of the words.  በተለይም፣ እንደዚህ (a) የተማረ የፊደል የተሰራ ቃላት አካባቢ እንዲያቆም የሚደረገውን የድምፅ ቃላትን መፍጠር ይማራለን፣ (b) እንደ መዝገብ ቋንቋ ቃላት ያልተፈቀደውን መፍጠር ይስማማል (c) እናም (ክፍል) በመጠቀም በተጠቃሚ ቃላት ውስጥ ወደሚደረግ መሠረት የሚደረገውን የвеctor ቦታ በክፍል ይኖራል፡፡ የሜኑዳዊ የbenchmark ዳታ ማድረጊያው ፈተና ውጤቶች በተዘጋጀው ማሰናከል የተጠቃሚ ስሜት በመጠበቅ ጊዜ የተጠቃሚ ስሜት እንዲያስወግድ ተፈተና ይችላል፡፡', 'tr': 'Uly korporada bilinen söz gabdalyklary adalatsyz bir döwlet, rasal, dini we etnik gabdalyklaryň ýokary derejesini kodlaýarlar. Ynsanlar bilen ýazylan sözlerin sözleriniň anlamlygyny samsyklyk, maksady we täsirsiz bir şekilde tassyklaýarlar. Biz öňünden eğlenen sözleri ulanan sözlerni ulanmak üçin bir täze teklip edip görýäris. Öňki eğitim çeşmelerine erişmek üçin yada ullanýan algoritmalar barada bilim gereksiz. Öň işimize görä, teklip eden yöntemimiz söz listleri şeklinde öň-belirlenmegi gerek däl we sözleriň tanımlaryndan saýlamak gereken sözleriň süýgütlerini öwrendirmez. Açıkçası, içeri giriş kelimesiniň debiased bir versiyonunu oluşturmak üçin bir ködler öwrendik. Bu şekilde (a) öňündeki eğlenen kelimesinin semantiklerini tutuyor, (b) sözlüke göre tanımlamayan kelimelere kabul edip, ve (c) sözlüke göre tüm biçimlenmiş vektörler tarafından uzaklaştırılýar. Bu şekilde tanımlanmış kelimelerde her tüm tersi vektörler arasında süpürilen bir vektör Standart benchmark veri setirlerinde örnekli netijeler görkezilýär ki, teklip eden yöntem öňünden kodlanýan sözler girişinde adalatsyz biasleri dogry çykarar we faydaly semantikleri saglabār.', 'hy': 'Բառերի ներառումները, որոնք պատրաստվում են մեծ կառուցվածքի վրա, ցույց են տվել, որ կոդավորում են անարդար խտրականության գենդերային, ռասական, կրոնական և էթնիկ կողմնականությունների բարձր մակարդակները: Դրան հակառակ, մարդ-գրված բառարանները համեմատական, օբյեկտիվ և առանձնահատուկ կերպ են նկարագրում բառերի իմաստը: Մենք առաջարկում ենք նախապատրաստված բառերի ներգրավման ձախողման մեթոդ՝ օգտագործելով բառարաններ, առանց պահանջելու հնարավորություն ունենալ սկզբնական ուսումնասիրության ռեսուրսներ կամ որևէ գիտելիք օգտագործված ալգորիթմների ներգրավման բառի մասին: Ի տարբերություն նախորդ աշխատանքին, մեր առաջարկված մեթոդը չի պահանջում, որ բառերի ցուցակների տեսակները նախասահմանափակվեն, և սովորում է այն սահմանափակումները, որոնք պետք է բառերի անկողմնափակված բառերի ավտոմատ ներգրավման միջոցով: Հատկապես, մենք սովորում ենք կոդեր ստեղծել ներդրված բառի թույլատրված տարբերակ այնպես, որ այն a) պահպանի նախապատրաստված բառի ներդրման սեմանտիկայը, b) համաձայն է բառի անկողմնակի սահմանման բառի հետ ըստ բառարանի, և c) մնում է օրթոգոնալ վեկտորի տարածության, որը տարածվում է նախապատրաստված բառային ներդրման տարածության ցանկացած կողմնակի հիմնական վեկտորի կողմի Ստանդարտ համեմատային տվյալների համակարգերի փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված մեթոդը ճշգրիտ կարող է վերացնել անարդար կողմնականությունները, որոնք կոդավորված են նախապատրաստ բառերի ներդրման մեջ, մինչդեռ պահպանել օգ', 'sq': 'Futjet e fjalëve të trajnuara në korpra të mëdha kanë treguar se kodojnë nivele të larta të paragjykimeve të padrejta diskriminuese gjinore, rasore, fetare dhe etnike. In contrast, human-written dictionaries describe the meanings of words in a concise, objective and an unbiased manner.  Ne propozojmë një metodë për të dobësuar përfshirjen e fjalëve të paratrajnuara duke përdorur fjalorë, pa kërkuar akses në burimet origjinale të trajnimit apo ndonjë njohuri lidhur me fjalën përfshirje algoritëm të përdorur. Ndryshe nga puna e mëparshme, metoda jonë e propozuar nuk kërkon që llojet e paracaktimit të paracaktohen në form ën e listave të fjalëve, dhe mëson kufizimet që duhet të përmbushen nga përfshirjet e fjalëve të papërcaktuara automatikisht nga përcaktimet e fjalëve në fjalë. Në mënyrë specifike, ne mësojmë një kodues për të gjeneruar një version të dobët të një fjale të hyrjes të përfshirë në mënyrë që (a) të mbajë semantikën e përfshirjes së fjalës së paratrajnuar, (b) të pajtohet me përcaktimin e pafajshëm të fjalës sipas fjalorin, dhe (c) të mbetet ortogonal në hapësirën vektor të zgjeruar nga çdo vektor bazë të paraprajshëm në hapësirën e përfshirjes së fjalës së paratrajnuar. Rezultatet eksperimentale mbi të dhënat standarte të referencës tregojnë se metoda e propozuar mund të heqë saktësisht paragjykimet e padrejta të koduara në përfshirjet e fjalëve të paratrajnuara, duke ruajtur semantikën e dobishme.', 'ca': "Les integracions de paraules entrenades en grans corpores han demostrat codificar nivells elevats de gènere discriminatori desleal, racial, religiós i étnic. En canvi, els diccionaris escrits per humans descriuen els significats de les paraules d'una manera concisa, objectiva i imparcial. We propose a method for debiasing pre-trained word embeddings using dictionaries, without requiring access to the original training resources or any knowledge regarding the word embedding algorithms used.  A diferència de la feina anterior, el nostre mètode proposat no requereix que els tipus de biases siguin predefinits en forma de llistes de paraules, i aprengui les restriccions que han de ser satisfetes per incorporacions de paraules imparcials automàticament a partir de definicions de diccionaris de paraules. Concretament, aprenem un codificador per generar una versió debilitada d'una paraula d'entrada incorporada de tal manera que (a) conservi la semàntica de l'incorporació de paraula pré-entrenada, (b) està d'acord amb la definició imparcial de la paraula segons el diccionari, i (c) siga ortogonal a l'espai vector ampliat per qualsevol vector de base imparcial a l'espai d'incorporació de paraula pré-entrenada. Els resultats experimentals dels conjunts de dades estandards de referència mostren que el mètode proposat pot eliminar amb precisió els prejudicis injustos codificats en incorporacions de paraules pré-entrenades, mantenint la semàntica útil.", 'bn': 'বিশাল কোর্পোরায় প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা শব্দের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে যে বৈষম্য, বর্ণবৈষম্য, ধর্মীয় এবং জাতিগত বৈষম্যের উচ্চপর্য বিপরীতে, মানুষের লেখা অভিধানের মানে বিশ্বাস, উদ্দেশ্য এবং বিভ্রান্ত ভাবে শব্দের মান বর্ণনা করে। আমরা সংবাদপত্র ব্যবহার করে পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত শব্দ বিভ্রান্ত করার একটি পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি, কোন প্রথম প্রশিক্ষণ সম্পদ বা কোন জ্ঞান নেই যে শব্দ ব্ পূর্বের কাজের ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভাবে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি নেই শব্দের তালিকায় পূর্বে নির্ধারিত বৈষম্যের ধরনের প্রয়োজনীয়তা নেই এবং শি বিশেষ করে আমরা একটি এনকোডার তৈরি করতে শিখি একটি ইনপুট শব্দের একটি বিভ্রান্ত সংস্করণ তৈরি করতে (a) এর পূর্ববর্তী প্রশিক্ষিত শব্দটির সেমেন্টিক্স রাখে (b) অভিধান অনুযায়ী শব্দের সংবাদের সাথে একমত, আর (c) ভেক্টরের স্থানে যে কোন ব স্ট্যান্ডার্ড বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি সঠিকভাবে পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত শব্দ বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন', 'cs': 'Vložení slov trénované na velkých korpusech ukázalo, že kóduje vysokou úroveň nespravedlivých diskriminačních genderových, rasových, náboženských a etnických předsudků. Naproti tomu slovníky psané člověkem popisují významy slov stručně, objektivně a nestranně. Navrhujeme metodu odstranění předškolených vložení slov pomocí slovníků, aniž by byl vyžadován přístup k originálním školicím zdrojům nebo jakékoliv znalosti týkající se použitých algoritmů vložení slov. Na rozdíl od předchozí práce, naše navržená metoda nevyžaduje, aby typy předsudků byly předem definovány ve formě seznamů slov, a naučí se omezení, která musí být splněna nezaujatými vloženími slov automaticky ze slovníkových definic slov. Konkrétně se naučíme kodér generovat debiazovanou verzi vložení vstupního slova tak, že (a) zachovává sémantiku předtrénovaného vložení slova, (b) souhlasí s nezaujatou definicí slova podle slovníku a (c) zůstává ortogonální k vektorovému prostoru rozpětému jakýmkoli zaujatými základními vektory v předtrénovaném vložení slova. Experimentální výsledky na standardních referenčních datových sadách ukazují, že navržená metoda dokáže přesně odstranit nekalé zaujatosti kódované v předem trénovaných vloženích slov při zachování užitečné sémantiky.', 'az': 'Büyük korporada təhsil edilən sözlərin yüksək səviyyələri haqsızlıq müxtəlif cinsi, ıraqlı, dini və etnik təsirlərin kodlamasını göstərmişdir. Əksinə, insan yazılmış sözləri sözlərin anlamını tədriclə, məqsədilə və tədriclə tədriclə müəyyən edirlər. Biz sözləri istifadə etmək üçün əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş sözlər içərisində yazılmış sözləri təhsil etmək üçün bir yöntem təklif edirik. Özgür təhsil kaynaqlarına və istifadə edilən sözləri içərisində yazılmış algoritmi haqqında heç bir bilgi yoxdur. Əvvəlki işlərə baxmayaraq, təklif edilmiş metodumuz sözlər listelərinin formasında əvvəl tərzlərin tərzlərini təsdiqləməsini istəməz və sözlərin tərzlərindən istifadə edilməli sözlərin tərzlərini öyrənir. Özellikle, biz kodlayıc ını sözlüklə uyğunlaşdırılmış bir giriş sözünün debiased versiyonu oluşturmaq üçün öyrənirik ki, o (a) əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş sözlərin semantiklərini saxlayar, b) sözlüklə uyğunlaşdırılmayan sözlərin tərzinə uyğunlaşdırılmayan tərzinə razılır, və c) hər hansı tərzinə təhsil edilmiş sözlərin genişlənmiş vektör məsafəsinə qoyur. Standart benchmark verilənlərin təcrübələrinin sonuçları göstərir ki, təcrübə olunan metodun əvvəlcə təcrübə edilmiş sözlərdə kodlanmış ədalətli tərzlərini dəyişdirə bilər, faydalı semantik qoruyarkən.', 'et': 'Suurtele korpustele koolitatud sõnade paigaldamine on näidanud kodeerivat ebaõiglast diskrimineerivat soolist, rassilist, usulist ja etnilist eelarvamust. Seevastu inimkirjutatud sõnastikud kirjeldavad sõnade tähendusi lühidalt, objektiivselt ja erapooletult. Pakume välja meetodi eelnevalt koolitatud sõna manustamiseks sõnaraamatute abil, ilma et oleks vaja juurdepääsu algsetele koolitusressurssidele või teadmisi kasutatud sõna manustamise algoritmide kohta. Erinevalt varasematest töödest ei nõua meie kavandatud meetod eelnevalt sõnaloendite vormis erapooletute tüüpide määratlemist ja õpib piiranguid, mis peavad olema täidetud erapooletute sõnade manustamisega automaatselt sõnastiku definitsioonidest. Täpsemalt õpime kodeerijat genereerima sisendsõna põimimise debiaseeritud versiooni nii, et a) säilitab eelõpetatud sõna põimimise semantika, (b) nõustub sõna erapooletu definitsiooniga vastavalt sõnastikule ja (c) jääb ortogonaalseks vektoriruumiga, mida hõlmavad eelõpetatud sõna põimimise ruumi erapooletud alusvektorid. Standardsete võrdlusandmekogumite eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et kavandatud meetod suudab täpselt kõrvaldada ebaõiglased kallakud, mis on kodeeritud eelõpetatud sõnade manustamisel, säilitades samas kasuliku semantika.', 'bs': 'Prikazivanje riječi obučenih na velikoj korpori pokazalo je da kodiraju visoke nivoe nepravednih diskriminacijskih spola, rasnih, religioznih i etničkih predrasuda. Za suprotno, ljudski pisani riječi opisuju značenje riječi na konkretnom, objektivnom i nepristrasnom načinu. Predlažemo metodu za debijaciju predobučenih riječi uključujući riječi, bez zahtjeva pristupa originalnim izvorima obuke ili bilo kakvih znanja o riječi uključujući algoritme. Za razliku od prethodnog rada, naša predložena metoda ne zahtijeva da se vrste predrasude predodređuju u obliku listi riječi i uči ograničenja koje moraju biti zadovoljene nepristrasnim riječima koje automatski uključuju iz definicija riječi riječi. Posebno, mi naučimo koder kako bi stvorili debijaznu verziju unutarnje riječi uključujuće tako da (a) zadržava semantiku predobučene riječi uključujući, b) se slaže sa nepristrasnom definicijom riječi u skladu s rečnikom, a (c) ostaje orthogonalno prema vektorskom prostoru spajanom od bilo kojih predrasudesnih vektori u predobučenom prostoru uključujući riječ. Eksperimentalni rezultati na standardnim bazama podataka pokazuju da predložena metoda može precizno ukloniti nepravedne predrasude kodirane u predobučenim uvođenim riječima, dok čuva korisne semantike.', 'fi': 'Suuriin korpusiin koulutetut sanasulautukset ovat osoittaneet koodaavan kohtuuttomia syrjiviä sukupuoli-, rotu-, uskonnollisia ja etnisiä ennakkoluuloja. Ihmiskirjoitetut sanakirjat sen sijaan kuvaavat sanojen merkityksiä ytimekkäästi, objektiivisesti ja puolueettomasti. Ehdotamme menetelmää esikoulutettujen sanojen upottamiseen sanakirjojen avulla tarvitsematta käyttää alkuperäisiä koulutusresursseja tai tietoa käytetyistä sanoista upotusalgoritmeista. Toisin kuin aikaisemmassa työssä, ehdotettu menetelmä ei edellytä ennakkomääritystä sanalistojen muodossa, vaan oppii rajoitukset, jotka puolueettomilla sanaupotuksilla on täytettävä automaattisesti sanakirjojen määritelmistä. Tarkemmin sanottuna opimme kooderin tuottamaan syötösanan upottamisesta debiased version siten, että se (a) säilyttää ennalta koulutetun sanan upottamisen semantiikan, (b) on samaa mieltä sanan puolueettoman määritelmän sanakirjan mukaan ja (c) pysyy ortogonaalisena sen vektoriavaruuden kanssa, jonka mahdolliset puolueelliset perusvektorit kattavat ennalta koulutetussa sanan upottamisavaruudessa. Standardien vertailuaineistojen kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotetulla menetelmällä voidaan poistaa tarkasti ennalta koulutetuissa sanaupotuksissa koodatut epäoikeudenmukaiset harhat säilyttäen samalla hyödyllisen semantiikan.', 'ha': "Kalmar da aka sanar da shi a kan makampuni mai girma sun nuna kodi darajõji na daban da bã tare da haƙƙi ba, rangi, addini da kabila. A tsakanin da shi, dictionaries da aka rubũta shi na faɗa ma'an an maganar mutane a cikin birane, na'anar da kuma wata ba'a sãɓa. Tuna buɗe wani hanyoyi wa yin ɓarna da maganar da aka yi amfani da dictionaries a gabãni, idan ba mu buƙata iznin wa zaman shawarar da aka amfani da shi ba ko wani ilmi game da maganar da aka shigar da algoritm masu amfani da. Fara kwamfyutan aiki da ya gabata, hanyoyinmu da aka buƙata ba ya ƙayyade nau'i-nau'in da za'a bayyana shi a gaba-gaba cikin tsarin jerin maganar, kuma ya sanar da kanana da za'a yarda da shi da maganar da ba'a sãɓa ba, daga fassarar maganar ta farat ɗaya. Aka ƙayyade, munã barci wani kode wa ya ƙiƙiro wani tsarin da aka shigar da shi a cikin tsarin da (a) ya riƙe semantikken maganar da aka yi wa shirin da shi a gaba ɗaya, (b) yana yarda da fassaran da ba'a bi'anar da maganar da aka ƙunsa da kuma (c) yana tsaya yana da orthogonal zuwa filin kashi na saka da wani mataimaki na daban cikin filin da aka yi amfani da. Mataimakin jarrabãwa na kanana tsarin bangon faɗaɗawa na ɗabi'a, ya nuna cewa shirin da aka buƙata, za'a iya tafiyar da haske masu inganci wanda ba'a yi taƙaita ba da taƙaita cikin tsarin maganar da aka yi amfani da shi a gaba-taƙaita, kuma a tsare semantiki masu amfani da shi.", 'sk': 'Besede, usposobljene na velikih korpusih, so pokazale, da kodirajo visoke stopnje nepoštenih diskriminatornih spolnih, rasnih, verskih in etničnih pristranskosti. Nasprotno pa človeško napisani slovarji opisujejo pomen besed na jedrnat, objektiven in nepristranski način. Predlagamo metodo za obremenitev vnaprej usposobljenih vdelav besed z uporabo slovarjev, brez dostopa do originalnih virov usposabljanja ali kakršnega koli znanja o uporabljenih algoritmih vdelave besed. Za razliko od predhodnega dela naša predlagana metoda ne zahteva, da bi bile vrste pristranskih pristranskosti vnaprej določene v obliki seznamov besed, temveč se nauči omejitev, ki jih je treba izpolniti z nepristranskimi vdelavami besed samodejno iz slovarskih definicij besed. Natančneje se naučimo kodirnika, ki ustvari debiasno različico vgradnje vhodne besede tako, da (a) ohrani semantiko vnaprej usposobljene besede, (b) se strinja z nepristransko definicijo besede glede na slovar in (c) ostane pravokoten vektorskemu prostoru, ki ga obsega kateri koli pristranski osnovni vektorji v vnaprej usposobljenem prostoru za vgradnjo besed. Poskusni rezultati standardnih referenčnih naborov podatkov kažejo, da lahko predlagana metoda natančno odstrani nepoštene pristranskosti, kodirane v vnaprej usposobljenih vdelavah besed, hkrati pa ohrani uporabno semantiko.', 'he': 'תוכניות מילים מאומנות על גופורה גדולה הראו לקוד רמות גבוהות של מין לא הוגן, גזעני, דתי ואטניות. בניגוד לזה, מילונים כתובים על ידי אדם מתארים את המשמעות של מילים בצורה קצרה, אובייקטיבית ובצורה לא מאומצת. We propose a method for debiasing pre-trained word embeddings using dictionaries, without requiring access to the original training resources or any knowledge regarding the word embedding algorithms used.  בניגוד לעבודה הקודמת, השיטה המוצעת שלנו לא דורשת שסוגי ההתמונות ייגדרו מראש בצורה של רשימות מילים, ולמד את ההגבלות שעליהן להיות מרוצות ע"י קישורים מילים לא מועמדים באופן אוטומטי מגדרי מילים של המילים. Specifically, we learn an encoder to generate a debiased version of an input word embedding such that it (a) retains the semantics of the pre-trained word embedding, (b) agrees with the unbiased definition of the word according to the dictionary, and (c) remains orthogonal to the vector space spanned by any biased basis vectors in the pre-trained word embedding space.  תוצאות ניסויים על קבוצות נתונים סטנדרטיים של רמזים מראות שהשיטה המוצעת יכולה להסיר בדיוק את ההתמחות הלא הוגנות מוצפנות בתכניות מילים מאומנות מראש, בזמן לשמור על סמנטיקה שימושית.', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་སྐོར་ཆེ་བའི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག མི་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡིན་པའི་བརྗོད་ཐོག་ཅིག་གི་གནད་དོན་ཡིག་གཟུགས་དང་། དམིགས་འབེབས་བྱས་མེད་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་ཚུ་བཤད་པ ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་གི་འཇུག་སྣོད་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་སྤྱོད་པ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་ཐོག་མགོ་སྟོན་རྒྱུ་དངོས་འབྲེལ ང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་སྔོན་ལྟར་བྱ་དང་མི་འདྲ་བ། ང་ཚོའི་དམིགས་འཛུགས་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་དགོས་པ་དེ་བཟོ་གཟུགས་རིས་ཡིག་ཐོ་འགོད་པའི་ནང་གི་སྔོན་ལྟར་འཛུགས་ཡོད་པ་དང་སྒྲུ Specifically, we learn an encoder to generate a debiased version of an input word embedding such that it (a) retains the semantics of the pre-trained word embedding, (b) agrees with the unbiased definition of the word according to the dictionary, and (c) remains orthogonal to the vector space spanned by any biased basis vectors in the pre-trained word embedding space. Experimental results on standard benchmark datasets show that the proposed method can accurately remove unfair biases encoded in pre-trained word embeddings, while preserving useful semantics.', 'jv': 'Walian word wrap punika dipunanggé lan akeh dumadhi durung. Yuta-Yuta, diketeksi sing rambarang-uwong pirsaké kelangan kelangan sampeyan, kawit lan kelangan kuwi mau. Anyone windows-action In spite of the vector space Refirm'}
{'en': 'Non-Autoregressive Text Generation with Pre-trained Language Models', 'es': 'Generación de texto no autorregresiva con modelos lingüísticos previamente entrenados', 'ar': 'إنشاء نصوص غير ذاتي الانحدار مع نماذج لغوية مدربة مسبقًا', 'pt': 'Geração de texto não autorregressiva com modelos de linguagem pré-treinados', 'fr': 'Génération de texte non autorégressive avec des modèles de langage préentraînés', 'ja': '事前にトレーニングされた言語モデルを使用した非自動回帰テキスト生成', 'zh': '用预训语模成非自归文本', 'hi': 'पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल के साथ गैर-Autoregressive पाठ जनरेशन', 'ru': 'Неавторегрессивная генерация текста с предварительно обученными языковыми моделями', 'ga': 'Giniúint Téacs Neamh-Uathghabhálach le Múnlaí Teanga Réamhoilte', 'hu': 'Nem automatikus regresszív szöveggenerálás előkészített nyelvi modellekkel', 'el': 'Δημιουργία κειμένου χωρίς αυτοανακριτική με προσχεδιασμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα', 'it': 'Generazione di testo non autoregressiva con modelli linguistici pre-formati', 'mk': 'Неавторегресивна генерација на текст со предобучени јазични модели', 'lt': 'Neautoregresinė teksto generacija su iš anksto parengtais kalbos modeliais', 'ml': 'പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളോടൊപ്പം സ്വയം രേഖപ്പെടുത്താത്ത പദാവലി സൃഷ്ടിക്കുക', 'ms': 'Jenerasi Teks Tidak Autoregresif dengan Model Bahasa Terlatih', 'mt': 'Ġenerazzjoni tat-Test Mhux Awtoregressiv b’Mudelli tal-Lingwa mħarrġa minn qabel', 'kk': 'Алдыңғы оқылған тіл үлгілерімен авторегрессивні емес мәтін құру', 'ka': 'არ ავტორეგრესიური ტექსტის შექმნა პროგრამეტრებული ენის მოდელებით', 'mn': 'Өмнөх сургалтын хэл загвартай автоматжруулагч биш', 'sr': 'Generacija teksta bez autoregresije sa predobučenim jezičkim modelima', 'no': 'Generering av ikkje- automatisk regressiv tekst med føretrengte språk- modeller', 'pl': 'Nieautoresywne generowanie tekstu z przeszkolonymi modelami językowymi', 'ro': 'Generare de text non-autoregresivă cu modele lingvistice pre-instruite', 'ta': 'முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரிகளுடன் தன்னியக்கமாக கட்டுப்பாட்டு உரை உருவாக்கம்', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරධාන භාෂා මොඩල් එක්ක ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය නොස්වයංක්\u200dරීය පාළුව නිර්මාණය', 'so': 'Non-Autoregressive Text Generation with Pre-trained Models', 'ur': 'غیر اٹوٹوگریسٹی ٹیکسٹ پیدائش پیدائش پیش آموزش کی زبان موڈل کے ساتھ', 'sv': 'Icke-autoregressiv textgenerering med förberedda språkmodeller', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Chưa quét tự động đoạn văn bản có mẫu ngôn ngữ', 'nl': 'Niet-autoregressieve tekstgeneratie met vooraf getrainde taalmodellen', 'bg': 'Неавторегресивно генериране на текст с предварително обучени езикови модели', 'hr': 'Neautoregresivna generacija teksta sa predobučenim jezičkim modelima', 'id': 'Generasi Teks Non-Autoregressive dengan Model Bahasa Terlatih', 'da': 'Ikke-autoregressiv tekstgenerering med forududdannede sprogmodeller', 'fa': 'تولید متن غیر خودگریز با مدل زبان پیش آموزش', 'tr': 'Öňünden eğlenen Diller bilen Otomatik Gaýşartma Metin Bejer', 'de': 'Nicht-autoregressive Texterstellung mit vortrainierten Sprachmodellen', 'sw': 'Generation of text', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i tekstit jo-automatik me modele gjuhësh të stërvitura', 'ko': '미리 훈련된 언어 모델을 바탕으로 하는 비자귀환 텍스트 생성', 'am': 'AutoRegressive Text Generation with Pre-trained Language Models', 'az': '√Ėn t…ôhsil edilmiŇü dil modell…ôri il…ô Avtomatik-Rekressiv Metin QurulmasńĪ', 'bs': 'Neautoregresivna generacija teksta sa predobučenim jezičkim modelima', 'af': 'Nie- Autoregressiewe Teks Genereer met vooraf- opgelei taal Modelle', 'ca': 'Generació de text no autoregressiva amb models de llenguatge pré-entrenats', 'cs': 'Neregresivní generování textu s předškolenými jazykovými modely', 'hy': 'Անինքնառեգրեսիվ տեքստի ստեղծումը նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելներով', 'bn': 'পূর্বপ্রশিক্ষিত ভাষা মোডেল সহযোগে অটোরেগ্রামিক টেক্সট জেনারেশন', 'et': 'Mitte-autoregressiivne teksti genereerimine eelõpetatud keelemudelitega', 'fi': 'Ei-autoregressiivinen tekstin luominen ennalta koulutettujen kielimallien avulla', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Nesamoregresivno ustvarjanje besedila s predhodno usposobljenimi jezikovnimi modeli', 'jv': 'Generation', 'he': 'יצירת טקסט לא אוטורגרסיבית עם מודלים שפות מאומנים מראש', 'bo': 'སྔོན་གྱིས་འཛིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་མ་ལག་ལེན་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་མ་བཟོ་བཅོས་མེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Non-autoregressive generation (NAG) has recently attracted great attention due to its fast inference speed. However, the generation quality of existing NAG models still lags behind their autoregressive counterparts. In this work, we show that BERT can be employed as the backbone of a NAG model for a greatly improved performance. Additionally, we devise two mechanisms to alleviate the two common problems of vanilla NAG models : the inflexibility of prefixed output length and the conditional independence of individual token predictions. To further strengthen the speed advantage of the proposed model, we propose a new decoding strategy, ratio-first, for applications where the output lengths can be approximately estimated beforehand. For a comprehensive evaluation, we test the proposed model on three text generation tasks, including text summarization, sentence compression and machine translation. Experimental results show that our model significantly outperforms existing non-autoregressive baselines and achieves competitive performance with many strong autoregressive models. In addition, we also conduct extensive analysis experiments to reveal the effect of each proposed component.', 'ar': 'حظي التوليد غير الانحدار الذاتي (NAG) مؤخرًا باهتمام كبير نظرًا لسرعة الاستدلال السريعة. ومع ذلك ، لا تزال جودة الجيل من طرازات NAG الحالية متخلفة عن نظيراتها الانحدارية الذاتية. في هذا العمل ، نوضح أنه يمكن استخدام BERT باعتباره العمود الفقري لنموذج NAG لتحسين الأداء بشكل كبير. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نبتكر آليتين للتخفيف من المشكلتين الشائعتين لنماذج Vanilla NAG: عدم مرونة طول الإخراج المسبق والاستقلال الشرطي لتنبؤات الرمز الفردي. لزيادة تعزيز ميزة السرعة للنموذج المقترح ، نقترح استراتيجية جديدة لفك التشفير ، النسبة أولاً ، للتطبيقات التي يمكن فيها تقدير أطوال المخرجات مسبقًا تقريبًا. لإجراء تقييم شامل ، نقوم باختبار النموذج المقترح على ثلاث مهام لإنشاء النص ، بما في ذلك تلخيص النص وضغط الجملة والترجمة الآلية. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نموذجنا يتفوق بشكل كبير على خطوط الأساس غير الانحدارية الحالية ويحقق أداءً تنافسيًا مع العديد من نماذج الانحدار الذاتي القوية. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نجري أيضًا تجارب تحليل مكثفة للكشف عن تأثير كل مكون مقترح.', 'pt': 'A geração não autorregressiva (NAG) atraiu recentemente grande atenção devido à sua rápida velocidade de inferência. No entanto, a qualidade de geração dos modelos NAG existentes ainda está atrás de suas contrapartes autorregressivas. Neste trabalho, mostramos que o BERT pode ser empregado como a espinha dorsal de um modelo NAG para um desempenho muito melhor. Além disso, desenvolvemos dois mecanismos para aliviar os dois problemas comuns dos modelos vanilla NAG: a inflexibilidade do comprimento de saída prefixado e a independência condicional das previsões de tokens individuais. Para fortalecer ainda mais a vantagem de velocidade do modelo proposto, propomos uma nova estratégia de decodificação, ratio-first, para aplicações onde os comprimentos de saída podem ser estimados aproximadamente de antemão. Para uma avaliação abrangente, testamos o modelo proposto em três tarefas de geração de texto, incluindo resumo de texto, compressão de frases e tradução automática. Os resultados experimentais mostram que nosso modelo supera significativamente as linhas de base não autorregressivas existentes e alcança um desempenho competitivo com muitos modelos autorregressivos fortes. Além disso, também realizamos extensos experimentos de análise para revelar o efeito de cada componente proposto.', 'fr': "La génération non autorégressive (NAG) a récemment fait l'objet d'une grande attention en raison de sa vitesse d'inférence rapide. Cependant, la qualité de génération des modèles NAG existants est toujours inférieure à celle de leurs homologues autorégressifs. Dans ce travail, nous montrons que le BERT peut être utilisé comme épine dorsale d'un modèle NAG pour améliorer considérablement les performances. De plus, nous concevons deux mécanismes pour atténuer les deux problèmes courants des modèles NAG classiques\xa0: la rigidité de la longueur de sortie préfixée et l'indépendance conditionnelle des prédictions de jetons individuels. Pour renforcer encore l'avantage de vitesse du modèle proposé, nous proposons une nouvelle stratégie de décodage, ratio d'abord, pour les applications où les longueurs de sortie peuvent être estimées approximativement au préalable. Pour une évaluation complète, nous testons le modèle proposé sur trois tâches de génération de texte, notamment la synthèse de texte, la compression de phrases et la traduction automatique. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre modèle surpasse de manière significative les lignes de base non autorégressives existantes et atteint des performances concurrentielles avec de nombreux modèles autorégressifs puissants. De plus, nous menons également des expériences d'analyse approfondies pour révéler l'effet de chaque composant proposé.", 'es': 'La generación no autorregresiva (NAG) recientemente ha atraído gran atención debido a su rápida velocidad de inferencia. Sin embargo, la calidad de generación de los modelos NAG existentes sigue siendo inferior a la de sus homólogos autorregresivos. En este trabajo, demostramos que BERT se puede emplear como la columna vertebral de un modelo NAG para mejorar considerablemente el rendimiento. Además, diseñamos dos mecanismos para aliviar los dos problemas comunes de los modelos NAG básicos: la inflexibilidad de la longitud de salida prefijada y la independencia condicional de las predicciones de tokens individuales. Para reforzar aún más la ventaja de velocidad del modelo propuesto, proponemos una nueva estrategia de decodificación, la relación primero, para aplicaciones en las que las longitudes de salida se pueden estimar aproximadamente de antemano. Para una evaluación exhaustiva, probamos el modelo propuesto en tres tareas de generación de texto, que incluyen el resumen de texto, la compresión de frases y la traducción automática. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro modelo supera significativamente a las líneas de base no autorregresivas existentes y logra un rendimiento competitivo con muchos modelos autorregresivos sólidos. Además, también realizamos experimentos de análisis exhaustivos para revelar el efecto de cada componente propuesto.', 'ja': '非自己回帰生成（ NAG ）は、その高速な推論速度により、最近大きな注目を集めている。 しかし、既存のNAGモデルの生成品質は、依然として自動回帰モデルよりも遅れています。 本作では、NAGモデルのバックボーンとしてBERTを採用し、性能を大幅に向上させることが示されている。 さらに、バニラナグモデルの2つの一般的な問題を緩和するための2つのメカニズムを考案しました。つまり、接頭辞付きの出力長の柔軟性がないことと、個々のトークン予測の条件付き独立性です。 提案されたモデルの速度の利点をさらに強化するために、出力の長さを事前に概算できるアプリケーションのための新しい復号戦略、レシオファーストを提案します。 包括的な評価のために、提案されたモデルを、テキスト要約、文圧縮、機械翻訳を含む3つのテキスト生成タスクでテストします。 実験結果は、当社のモデルが既存の非自己回帰ベースラインを大幅に上回り、多くの強力な自己回帰モデルで競争力のあるパフォーマンスを達成していることを示しています。 さらに、提案された各構成要素の効果を明らかにするための広範な分析実験も行っている。', 'zh': '非自归生成(NAG)近因速推理。 然今有 NAG 模者,犹后其自归也。 吾示BERT可以为NAG骨,以大大提高性能。 设二机以纾众NAG二常见问题:前缀输长不灵活性,与令牌占独立性。 增其形势,新其解码策,先其先度。 试三本以成形,包摘要句压缩机器翻译。 实验结果表明,吾形明优于今非自归基线,而于诸强者自归于竞。 博析实验,以明议组成部分之效。', 'hi': 'गैर autoregressive पीढ़ी (NAG) ने हाल ही में अपनी तेज अनुमान गति के कारण बहुत ध्यान आकर्षित किया है। हालांकि, मौजूदा एनएजी मॉडल की पीढ़ी की गुणवत्ता अभी भी अपने ऑटोरिग्रेसिव समकक्षों से पीछे है। इस काम में, हम दिखाते हैं कि BERT को बहुत बेहतर प्रदर्शन के लिए NAG मॉडल की रीढ़ के रूप में नियोजित किया जा सकता है। इसके अतिरिक्त, हम वेनिला एनएजी मॉडल की दो सामान्य समस्याओं को कम करने के लिए दो तंत्र तैयार करते हैं: पूर्वनिर्धारित आउटपुट लंबाई की लचीलापन और व्यक्तिगत टोकन भविष्यवाणियों की सशर्त स्वतंत्रता। प्रस्तावित मॉडल के गति लाभ को और मजबूत करने के लिए, हम एक नई डिकोडिंग रणनीति का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, अनुपात-पहले, उन अनुप्रयोगों के लिए जहां आउटपुट लंबाई का अनुमान पहले से ही लगाया जा सकता है। एक व्यापक मूल्यांकन के लिए, हम पाठ सारांश, वाक्य संपीड़न और मशीन अनुवाद सहित तीन पाठ पीढ़ी के कार्यों पर प्रस्तावित मॉडल का परीक्षण करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल मौजूदा गैर-ऑटोरिग्रेसिव बेसलाइन को काफी बेहतर बनाता है और कई मजबूत ऑटोरिग्रेसिव मॉडल के साथ प्रतिस्पर्धी प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है। इसके अलावा, हम प्रत्येक प्रस्तावित घटक के प्रभाव को प्रकट करने के लिए व्यापक विश्लेषण प्रयोग भी करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Неавторегрессивная генерация (NAG) в последнее время привлекает большое внимание из-за своей быстрой скорости вывода. Однако качество генерации существующих моделей NAG все еще отстает от их авторегрессивных аналогов. В этой работе мы показываем, что BERT может быть использован в качестве основы модели NAG для значительно улучшенной производительности. Кроме того, мы разработали два механизма для облегчения двух общих проблем моделей ванильного НАГ: негибкость префиксной длины вывода и условная независимость индивидуальных предсказаний токенов. Для дальнейшего усиления преимущества скорости предлагаемой модели, мы предлагаем новую стратегию декодирования, ratio-first, для приложений, где выходные длины могут быть приблизительно оценены заранее. Для всесторонней оценки мы тестируем предлагаемую модель на трех задачах генерации текста, включая обобщение текста, сжатие предложений и машинный перевод. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наша модель значительно превосходит существующие неавторегрессивные базовые линии и достигает конкурентных показателей со многими сильными авторегрессивными моделями. Кроме того, мы также проводим обширные аналитические эксперименты, чтобы выявить эффект каждого предлагаемого компонента.', 'ga': "Tá aird mhór tarraingthe ar ghiniúint neamh-uathchéimneach (NAG) le déanaí mar gheall ar a luas tátal tapa. Mar sin féin, tá cáilíocht giniúna na samhlacha NAG atá ann cheana chun deiridh fós ar a gcomhghleacaithe uath-aischéimnitheacha. San obair seo, léirímid gur féidir BERT a úsáid mar chnámh droma samhail NAG le haghaidh feidhmíochta feabhsaithe go mór. Ina theannta sin, ceapaimid dhá mheicníocht chun an dá fhadhb choitianta a bhaineann le samhlacha NAG fanaile a mhaolú: dolúbthacht an fhad aschuir réimírithe agus neamhspleáchas coinníollach réamh-mheastacháin comharthaí aonair. Chun buntáiste luais na samhla a mholtar a neartú tuilleadh, molaimid straitéis díchódaithe nua, cóimheas-an chéad, d'fheidhmchláir inar féidir na faid aschuir a mheas, a bheag nó a mhór, roimh ré. Chun meastóireacht chuimsitheach a dhéanamh, déanaimid tástáil ar an tsamhail atá beartaithe ar thrí thasc giniúna téacs, lena n-áirítear achoimre téacs, comhbhrú abairtí agus aistriúchán meaisín. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go sáraíonn ár samhail na bonnlínte neamh-uathchéimnitheacha atá ann cheana féin go suntasach agus go mbaineann sé feidhmíocht iomaíoch amach le go leor samhlacha uathchéimnitheacha láidre. Ina theannta sin, déanaimid turgnaimh anailíse fairsinge freisin chun éifeacht gach comhpháirte molta a nochtadh.", 'el': "Η μη αυτοανακριτική παραγωγή έχει προσελκύσει πρόσφατα μεγάλη προσοχή λόγω της γρήγορης ταχύτητας συμπερασμάτων της. Ωστόσο, η ποιότητα παραγωγής των υφιστάμενων μοντέλων NAG εξακολουθεί να υστερεί πίσω από τους αυτοανακριτικούς ομολόγους τους. Σε αυτή την εργασία, αποδεικνύουμε ότι μπορεί να χρησιμοποιηθεί ως η ραχοκοκαλιά ενός μοντέλου για μια πολύ βελτιωμένη απόδοση. Επιπλέον, σχεδιάζουμε δύο μηχανισμούς για την ανακούφιση των δύο κοινών προβλημάτων των μοντέλων βανίλιας: την ακαμψία του προκαθορισμένου μήκους εξόδου και την υπό όρους ανεξαρτησία των επιμέρους προβλέψεων συμβολαίων. Για να ενισχυθεί περαιτέρω το πλεονέκτημα ταχύτητας του προτεινόμενου μοντέλου, προτείνουμε μια νέα στρατηγική αποκωδικοποίησης, κατ' αρχήν, για εφαρμογές όπου τα μήκη εξόδου μπορούν να εκτιμηθούν κατά προσέγγιση εκ των προτέρων. Για μια ολοκληρωμένη αξιολόγηση, δοκιμάζουμε το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο σε τρεις εργασίες δημιουργίας κειμένου, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της σύνοψης κειμένου, της συμπίεσης προτάσεων και της μηχανικής μετάφρασης. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά σημαντικά τις υπάρχουσες μη αυτοανακριτικές γραμμές βάσης και επιτυγχάνει ανταγωνιστική απόδοση με πολλά ισχυρά αυτοανακριτικά μοντέλα. Επιπλέον, διεξάγουμε επίσης εκτεταμένα πειράματα ανάλυσης για να αποκαλύψουμε την επίδραση κάθε προτεινόμενου συστατικού.", 'hu': 'A nem autoregresszív generáció (NAG) a közelmúltban nagy figyelmet vonzott a gyors következtetési sebessége miatt. A meglévő NAG modellek generációs minősége azonban még mindig elmarad az autoregresszív társaiktól. Ebben a munkában megmutatjuk, hogy a BERT egy NAG modell gerincének alkalmazható a nagymértékben javított teljesítmény érdekében. Továbbá két mechanizmust dolgozunk ki a vanília NAG modellek két közös problémájának enyhítésére: az előzetes kimeneti hossz rugalmatlansága és az egyes token előrejelzések feltételes függetlensége. A javasolt modell sebességelőnyének további erősítése érdekében új dekódolási stratégiát javasolunk, az arány-first, olyan alkalmazások esetében, ahol a kimeneti hosszúság megközelítőleg előzetesen becsülhető. Az átfogó értékelés érdekében a javasolt modellt három szöveggenerálási feladaton teszteljük, beleértve a szövegösszefoglalást, a mondattömörítést és a gépi fordítást. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy modellünk jelentősen felülmúlja a meglévő, nem autoregresszív alapvonalakat, és versenyképes teljesítményt ér el számos erős autoregresszív modellel. Emellett kiterjedt elemzési kísérleteket is végezünk, hogy feltárjuk az egyes javasolt komponensek hatását.', 'it': "La generazione non autoregressiva (NAG) ha recentemente attirato grande attenzione a causa della sua velocità di inferenza veloce. Tuttavia, la qualità di generazione dei modelli NAG esistenti è ancora in ritardo rispetto alle controparti autoregressive. In questo lavoro, mostriamo che BERT può essere utilizzato come spina dorsale di un modello NAG per una prestazione notevolmente migliorata. Inoltre, elaboriamo due meccanismi per alleviare i due problemi comuni dei modelli NAG vanilla: l'inflessibilità della lunghezza di uscita prefissa e l'indipendenza condizionale delle previsioni dei singoli token. Per rafforzare ulteriormente il vantaggio di velocità del modello proposto, proponiamo una nuova strategia di decodifica, ratio-first, per applicazioni in cui le lunghezze di uscita possono essere stimate approssimativamente in anticipo. Per una valutazione completa, testiamo il modello proposto su tre attività di generazione del testo, tra cui sintesi del testo, compressione delle frasi e traduzione automatica. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il nostro modello supera significativamente le linee di base non autoregressive esistenti e raggiunge prestazioni competitive con molti modelli autoregressivi forti. Inoltre, conduciamo anche ampi esperimenti di analisi per rivelare l'effetto di ogni componente proposto.", 'mk': 'Неавторегресивната генерација (НАГ) неодамна привлече големо внимание поради брзата брзина на конференција. Сепак, квалитетот на генерацијата на постоечките модели на НАГ сé уште останува зад нивните авторегресивни колеги. Во оваа работа покажуваме дека БЕРТ може да биде вработен како грб на моделот НАГ за значително подобрена изведба. Покрај тоа, ние создаваме два механизми за олеснување на двата заеднички проблеми на ванилските НАГ модели: нефлексибилноста на префиксираната должина на излез и условната независност на индивидуалните предвидувања на знаци. За понатамошно зајакнување на предложената предност на брзината на моделот, предложуваме нова стратегија за декодирање, однос-прв, за апликациите каде што должината на излезот може да се процени приближно претходно. За сеопфатна оценка, го тестираме предложениот модел на три задачи за генерација на текст, вклучувајќи резултат на текстот, компресија на речениците и машински превод. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот модел значително ги надминува постоечките неавторегресивни бази линии и постигнува конкурентни резултати со многу силни авторегресивни модели. Покрај тоа, ние исто така спроведуваме експерименти на експерименти за анализа за да го откриеме ефектот на секој предложен компонент.', 'ms': 'Generasi bukan-autoregresif (NAG) baru-baru ini menarik perhatian besar kerana kelajuan kesimpulannya yang cepat. Namun, kualiti generasi model NAG yang wujud masih tertinggal di belakang rekan-rekan mereka. Dalam kerja ini, kami menunjukkan bahawa BERT boleh digunakan sebagai tulang belakang model NAG untuk prestasi yang lebih baik. Selain itu, kami merancang dua mekanisme untuk mengurangi dua masalah umum model NAG vanilla: ketidaklengkapan panjang output terdahulu dan kemerdekaan syarat ramalan token individu. Untuk menguatkan lebih lanjut keuntungan kelajuan model yang direncanakan, kami cadangkan strategi penyahkodan baru, nisbah-pertama, untuk aplikasi di mana panjang output boleh dijangka kira-kira sebelumnya. Untuk penilaian yang meliputi, kami menguji model yang direncanakan pada tiga tugas pembuatan teks, termasuk penilaian teks, pemampatan kalimat dan terjemahan mesin. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa model kita secara signifikan melebihi garis dasar yang tidak-autoregresif yang wujud dan mencapai prestasi kompetitif dengan banyak model autoregresif yang kuat. In addition, we also conduct extensive analysis experiments to reveal the effect of each proposed component.', 'kk': 'Автогрегрессиялық емес (NAG) жаңа уақытта өзінің жылдамдығын түсіндіру жылдамдығын себеп көңіл берді. Бірақ NAG үлгілерінің негізделген сапасы әлі олардың авторегрессиялық қарсыларының артында қалды. Бұл жұмыс істеу үшін BERT дегенді NAG үлгісінің жақсы жұмыс істеу үшін қолдануға болады. Сонымен қатар, біз ванила NAG үлгілерінің екі жалпы мәселелерін көшірмелеу үшін екі механизм құрылдық: префикс шығыс ұзындығының ұзындығы және жеке белгілі таңбалардың тәуелсіздігі. Келтірілген моделінің жылдамдығын бағалау үшін, біріншіден жаңа декодтау стратегиясы, қатынасы, біріншіден, шығыс ұзындығын алдында бағалауға болады. Толық оқиға үшін бұл үш мәтін құру тапсырмаларының үшін үш мәтін құру тапсырмаларын тексереміз, мәтін тұжырымдамасы, сөздерді компрессия және машинаның аудар Эксперименталдық нәтижелері біздің моделіміздің авторегрессиялық емес негізгі сызықтарды өзгертіп, көптеген авторегрессиялық үлгілерден конкуренциялық істеуді жеткізеді. Қосымша, біз әрбір таңдалған компонентінің эффектін көрсету үшін кеңейтілген анализ тәжірибелерін жасаймыз.', 'lt': 'Neseniai neautoregresinė karta (NAG) labai daug dėmesio atkreipė į greitą jos išvados greitį. Tačiau esamų NAG modelių gamybos kokybė vis dar atsilieka nuo jų saviregistruojančių partnerių. Šiame darbe parodome, kad BERT gali būti naudojamas kaip NAG modelio pagrindas gerokai pagerinti veiklos rezultatus. Be to, sukuriame du mechanizmus, kuriais palengvinamos dvi bendros vanilės NAG modelių problemos: iš anksto nustatyto išėjimo ilgio nelengvumas ir sąlyginis atskirų ženklų prognozių nepriklausomumas. To further strengthen the speed advantage of the proposed model, we propose a new decoding strategy, ratio-first, for applications where the output lengths can be approximately estimated beforehand.  Kad būtų atliktas išsamus vertinimas, bandome siūlomą model į atlikti tris teksto kūrimo užduotis, įskaitant teksto santrauką, sakinių spaudimą ir mašininį vertimą. Experimental results show that our model significantly outperforms existing non-autoregressive baselines and achieves competitive performance with many strong autoregressive models.  Be to, atliekame išsamius analizės eksperimentus, kad atskleistume kiekvieno siūlomo komponento poveikį.', 'ka': 'არ ავტორეგრესიური განვითარება (NAG) ახლა მხოლოდ დიდი აღმოჩენა მისი სიჩქარე ინფრესის სიჩქარე. მაგრამ, მსგავსი NAG მოდელების წარმოდგენება უკეთესი თავისი ავტორეგრესიური კონტრესიური მხარდაჭერების შემდეგ. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ BERT შეიძლება იყენება როგორც NAG მოდელის ძალიან უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უ დამატებით, ჩვენ დავიწყეთ ორი მექანსიმენტი, რომ განილია NAG მოდელების ორი საერთო პრობლემები გადავიწყეთ: პრეფიქსირებული გამოყენების სიგრძე და განსხვავებული განსხვავებების განსხვავებელობა დამატებით მოდელის სიჩქარე წინაღება, ჩვენ მინდა ახალი სტრიქტიკოდის სტრატიგია, პირველი პროფიცია, პროფიცია, პირველი პროფიცია, სადაც გამოყენება სიჩქარე შეიძლება იყოს ყველაფერი განსაზღვრებისთვის, ჩვენ შევცვალობთ მოდელს სამი ტექსტის განვითარებისთვის სამუშაო პარამეტრებისთვის, რომელიც ტექსტის გასაზღვრება, სიტყ ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები ჩვენი მოდელი მნიშვნელოვანია, რომ არსებობს ავტორეგრესიური ფესტიური ფესტიური ფესტიური ფესტიური ხაზები და კონკრესიური გამოსახულებ დამატებით, ჩვენ ასევე გავაკეთებთ უფრო დიდი ანალიზი ექსპერიმენტები, რომლებიც აღმოჩვენებთ ყველა მინდა კომპონენტის ექსპ', 'no': 'Ikkje autoregressivt generasjon (NAG) har nyleg attrakta stor oppmerksomhet på grunn av raske infeksjonsfartet. Generasjonskvaliteten av eksisterande NAG-modeller ligg likevel bak sine autoregressive mottakarar. I dette arbeidet viser vi at BERT kan arbeidast som bakgrunnsbanen av eit NAG-modell for ein stort forbetra utvikling. I tillegg bestemmer vi to mekanisme for å redusera dei to felles problemene i vanylige NAG-modeller: utviklinga av prefiksa utgangsslengde og kondicionalt uavhengighet av individuelle token-forhåndsvising. For å styrke fartsforvalet til den foreslåtte modellen, foreslår vi ein ny dekodingsstrategi, forholdførst for programmer der lengden for utdata kan bli omtrent anslått før. For ein komplett evaluering tester vi den foreslåde modellen på tre tekstoppgåver, inkludert tekstsamansering, setningskomprimering og maskinsomsetjing. Eksperimentale resultat viser at modellen vårt betydelig utfører eksisterande ikkje-autoregressiv baselinjer og oppnår konkurentiv utvikling med mange sterke autoregressiv modeller. I tillegg gjer vi også utvida analyserte eksperimenter for å opna effekten av kvar foreslått komponent.', 'ml': 'Non-autoregressive generation (NAG) has recently attracted great attention due to its fast inference speed.  എന്നാലും, നിലവിലുള്ള NAG മോഡലുകളുടെ തലമുറയില്\u200d നിന്നും നിലവിലുള്ള തരത്തിന്\u200dറെ ഗുണവും അവയുടെ സ്വതന്ത്ര ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, ബെര്\u200dട്ടിന് ഒരു നാജി മോഡലിന്റെ പിന്നില്\u200d ജോലി ചെയ്യാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുമെന്ന്. വളര കൂടാതെ നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു മെക്കാന്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു. വായില്ലാ നാജി മോഡലുകളുടെ രണ്ട് സാധാരണ പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d ലഘൂകരിക്കുവാന്\u200d: മുന്\u200dനിര്\u200dമ്മിതമായ പ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലിന്\u200dറെ വേഗത്തില്\u200d സുഖാനുഭവങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ശക്തിപ്പെടുത്തുവാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, പുതിയ ഡോകോഡിങ് സ്ട്രായ്ട്രിക്ക മൂന്നു തലമുറതലമുറയുടെ ജോലികളില്\u200d നാം പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച മോഡല്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ചുരുക്കം ചെയ്യുന്നതും, വാക പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള സ്വതന്ത്രീകരണത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങളില്\u200d പ്രകട കൂടാതെ, ഓരോ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഗത്തിന്റെയും പ്രഭാവം വെളിപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d വേണ്ടി നാം വിശാലമാ', 'mt': 'Il-ġenerazzjoni mhux awtoregressiva (NAG) reċentement ġibdet attenzjoni kbira minħabba l-veloċità mgħaġġla ta’ inferenza tagħha. Madankollu, il-kwalità tal-ġenerazzjoni tal-mudelli eżistenti tan-NAG għadha lura għall-kontropartijiet awtoregressivi tagħhom. F’dan ix-xogħol, naraw li l-BERT jista’ jintuża bħala s-sinsla ta’ mudell NAG għal prestazzjoni mtejba ħafna. Barra minn hekk, aħna nħejju żewġ mekkaniżmi biex itaffu ż-żewġ problemi komuni tal-mudelli tal-vanilla NAG: l-inflessibbiltà tat-tul tal-output prefissat u l-indipendenza kondizzjonali tat-tbassir individwali tat-tokens. Biex jissaħħa ħ aktar il-vantaġġ tal-veloċità tal-mudell propost, qed nipproponu strateġija ġdida ta’ dekodifikazzjoni, proporzjon l-ewwel, għal applikazzjonijiet fejn it-tul tal-output jista’ jiġi stmat bejn wieħed u ieħor minn qabel. Għal evalwazzjoni komprensiva, nistestjaw il-mudell propost fuq tliet kompiti ta’ ġenerazzjoni tat-testi, inkluż sommarju tat-test, kompressjoni tas-sentenzi u traduzzjoni bil-magna. Riżultati esperimentali juru li l-mudell tagħna jaqbeż b’mod sinifikanti l-linji bażi eżistenti mhux awtoregressivi u jikseb prestazzjoni kompetittiva b’ħafna mudelli awtoregressivi b’saħħithom. In addition, we also conduct extensive analysis experiments to reveal the effect of each proposed component.', 'mn': 'Саяхан автоматжуулах бус үеийнх (НАГ) нь хурдан халдварын хурдаас маш их анхаарал татсан. Гэхдээ НАГ загварын үеийн сайн чанар өөрсдийнхөө сэтгэл хөдлөл сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хамтрагчдын ард байдаг. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид БЕРТ-г НАГ загварын үндсэн хөдөлгөөн болгон ашиглаж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна. Мөн бид ванила НАГ загварын хоёр нийтлэг асуудлыг багасгах хоёр механизм төлөвлөгдөж байна: өмнөх гаргасан гаргасан урт болон хувийн тодорхойлолтын шаардлагатай байдал юм. Загварын хурдан давуу давуу талыг илүү баталуулахын тулд бид эхлээд шинэ шинэ загварын шинэ стратеги, харьцаа-эхлээд хэрэглээний урт нь ойролцоогоор өмнө тооцоолж чадна. Бид бүрэн дүгнэлт хийх үед 3 текст бүтээлтийн даалгаварын загварыг шалгаж үзнэ. Мэдээлэл дуран дуран, өгүүлбэр даралтыг, машины хөрөнгө оруулалт. Эмчилгээний үр дүнд бидний загвар нь автоматжруулагдаагүй суурь шугам шугам дээр маш чухал байдаг. Мөн олон хүчтэй автоматжруулагч загвартай өрсөлдөөнтэй үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг. Мөн бид санал өгсөн компонент бүрийн нөлөөг илэрхийлж олон шинжилгээний туршилтыг хийдэг.', 'sr': 'Neautoregresivna generacija (NAG) nedavno je privukla veliku pažnju zbog brze brzine infekcije. Međutim, kvalitet generacije postojećih modela NAG još uvijek ostaje iza njihovih autoregresivnih kolega. U ovom poslu pokazujemo da se BERT može zaposliti kao kost NAG model a za veoma poboljšan izvedbe. Osim toga, smislili smo dva mehanizma da smanjimo dva zajednička problema modela vanilne NAG-a: neprihvatljivost predviđene dužine izlaza i uvjetne nezavisnosti predviđanja pojedinih znakova. Da bismo dalje jačali prednost brzine predloženog model a, predlažemo novu strategiju za dekodiranje, odnos prvo, za aplikacije u kojima se dužina proizvoda može približno proceniti ranije. Za sveobuhvatnu procenu, testiramo predloženi model na tri zadatka za generaciju teksta, uključujući sažetak teksta, kompresiju rečenica i prevod mašine. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model značajno iznosi postojeće ne-autoregresivne osnovne linije i postiže konkurentne funkcije sa mnogim jakim autoregresivnim modelima. Osim toga, mi takođe vodimo široke analize eksperimente kako bi otkrili učinak svakog predloženog komponenta.', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවක් නැති ප්\u200dරමාණය (NAG) අවස්ථානයෙන් ගොඩක් අවධානය අල්ලගත්තා. නමුත්, ඉතින් NAG මෝඩේල් වලින් ප්\u200dරමාණය තවමත් ඔවුන්ගේ ස්වයංග්\u200dරේෂණ ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෝ පිටිපස්සේ ඉ මේ වැඩේ අපි පෙන්වන්නම් BERT විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් NAG මොඩේල් එකේ පිටිපස්සෙක් වෙනුවෙන් ගොඩක් වැඩි වැඩි වැ තවත්, අපි වැනිලා NAG මොඩලයේ සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක් අඩංගු කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා: ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු මොඩල් එකේ වේගය ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් විතරයි, අපි අළුත් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා අලුත් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක්, අනු සම්පූර්ණ විශ්ලේෂණයක් විතරයි, අපි පරීක්ෂා කරන්න පුළුවන් මොඩල් තුනක් ප්\u200dරවෘති ව්\u200dයාපෘති ව්\u200dයාපෘති  පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩේල් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නොස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්ම ඒ වගේම, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්ලේෂණ පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා හැම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්න.', 'pl': 'Generacja nieautoregresywna (NAG) przyciągnęła ostatnio dużą uwagę ze względu na szybką prędkość wnioskowania. Jednak jakość generacji istniejących modeli NAG nadal pozostaje w tyle za autoregresywnymi odpowiednikami. W niniejszej pracy pokazujemy, że BERT może być stosowany jako kręgosłup modelu NAG dla znacznie poprawy wydajności. Dodatkowo opracowano dwa mechanizmy łagodzące dwa powszechne problemy modeli waniliowych NAG: nieelastyczność długości wyjścia z prefiksu oraz warunkową niezależność poszczególnych prognoz tokenów. Aby jeszcze bardziej wzmocnić przewagę prędkości proponowanego modelu, proponujemy nową strategię dekodowania, stosunkowo-first, dla zastosowań, w których długość wyjściowa można przybliżyć wcześniej. W celu kompleksowej oceny, testujemy proponowany model na trzech zadaniach generowania tekstu, w tym podsumowanie tekstu, kompresję zdań i tłumaczenie maszynowe. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasz model znacznie przewyższa istniejące nieautoregresywne linie bazowe i osiąga konkurencyjność z wieloma silnymi autoregresywnymi modelami. Ponadto prowadzimy również obszerne eksperymenty analityczne, aby ujawnić efekt każdego proponowanego składnika.', 'sv': 'Icke-autoregressiv generation (NAG) har nyligen fått stor uppmärksamhet på grund av dess snabba inferenshastighet. Produktionskvaliteten för de befintliga NAG-modellerna ligger dock fortfarande efter sina autoregressiva motsvarigheter. I detta arbete visar vi att BERT kan användas som ryggraden i en NAG-modell för en kraftigt förbättrad prestanda. Dessutom utformar vi två mekanismer för att lindra de två vanliga problemen med vanilj NAG-modeller: oflexibiliteten i prefixed output längd och villkorligt oberoende av individuella token förutsägelser. För att ytterligare stärka hastighetsfördelen med den föreslagna modellen föreslår vi en ny avkodningsstrategi, ratio-first, för applikationer där utgångsländerna kan uppskattas ungefär i förväg. För en omfattande utvärdering testar vi den föreslagna modellen på tre textgenereringsuppgifter, inklusive textsammanfattning, meningskompression och maskinöversättning. Experimentella resultat visar att vår modell avsevärt överträffar befintliga icke-autoregressiva baslinjer och uppnår konkurrenskraftig prestanda med många starka autoregressiva modeller. Dessutom genomför vi omfattande analysexperiment för att avslöja effekten av varje föreslagen komponent.', 'ro': 'Generarea non-autoregresivă (NAG) a atras recent o mare atenție datorită vitezei sale rapide de inferență. Cu toate acestea, calitatea generației modelelor NAG existente rămâne încă în urma omologilor lor autoregresive. În această lucrare, arătăm că BERT poate fi folosit ca coloană vertebrală a unui model NAG pentru o performanță semnificativ îmbunătățită. În plus, concepem două mecanisme pentru a atenua cele două probleme comune ale modelelor NAG vanilie: inflexibilitatea lungimii de ieșire prefixate și independența condiționată a previziunilor individuale de token. Pentru a consolida și mai mult avantajul de viteză al modelului propus, propunem o nouă strategie de decodare, raport-first, pentru aplicații în care lungimile de ieșire pot fi aproximativ estimate în prealabil. Pentru o evaluare cuprinzătoare, testăm modelul propus pe trei sarcini de generare a textului, inclusiv rezumarea textului, compresia propozițiilor și traducerea automată. Rezultatele experimentale arată că modelul nostru depășește semnificativ liniile de bază non-autoregresive existente și atinge performanțe competitive cu multe modele autoregresive puternice. În plus, efectuăm, de asemenea, experimente extinse de analiză pentru a dezvălui efectul fiecărei componente propuse.', 'ta': 'தானியங்கி கட்டுப்படுத்தாத தலைமுறை (NAG) சமீபத்தில் அதிக வேகமான சுற்றும் வேகம் காரணத்தால் மிகவும் கவனத்தை attractive. ஆனால், இருக்கும் NAG மாதிரிகளின் உருவத்தின் தரம் இன்னும் தங்கள் தானியங்கி கட்டுப்பாட்டு எதிரிகளுக்கு பின் இந்த வேலையில், நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் BERT ஒரு மிகவும் மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட செயல்பாட்டிற்கான ஒரு NAG மாதிரியின் பின் மேலும், நாம் இரண்டு முறைமைகளை உருவாக்கி வெளியீட்டு நீளத்தின் முன்னோட்டு வெளியீட்டு நீளத்தின் பொதுவான பிரச்சனைகளை எளிதாக்குவதற்கான திருத்தப்பட்ட மாதிரியின் வேகத்தை மேலும் அதிகரிக்க, வெளியீட்டு நீளம் முன்னால் கணக்கிடப்படும் பயன்பாடு மூன்று உரை உரை தலைமுறை பணிகளில் நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரியை சோதிக்கிறோம், உரை சுருக்கம், வாக்கு சுருக்கம் மற்றும் இயந முயற்சி முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது நம் மாதிரி தற்போதைய தன்னியக்க கட்டுப்பாட்டு அல்லாத அடிப்படைகளை முன்னேற்றுகிறது மற்றும் பல மேலும், நாம் ஒவ்வொரு பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட பகுதியின் விளைவை வெளிப்படுத்துவதற்கான விரிவான ஆய்வு சோதன', 'so': "Qarniga aan auto-regressive (NAG) ugu dhowaan ayaa aad u taxadaray daryeel aad u dheer, sababtoo ah dhaqdhaqaaqigeeda degdeg ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, muuqashada NAG ee jiraan weli waxay ku hadhaan saaxiibbadooda madaxa u ah. Shaqadan waxaynu tusnaynaa in BERT looga shaqeyn karo sida muusikada NAG oo aad u hagaajiyey. Sidoo kale waxaan sameynaa laba mekani si aan u fududayno labada dhibaato oo caadiga ah ee noocyada NAG-ka ah: saameyn u yeelashada dhererka ka hore iyo xornimada shuruudaha ah oo gaarka ah ee warqada shakhsiga ah. Si aan ugu sii kordhiyo faa'iidada dhaqdhaqaalaha modelka la soo jeeday, waxaynu u soo jeedaynaa qoraal cusub oo deynta, qayb-horaadka ugu horraysa, waana codsiyadaha lagu xisaabi karo mudada soo baxa oo hore lagu qiimeyn karo. Qiimeynta aasaasiga ah, waxaynu imtixaannaa modelka la soo jeeday oo ku qoran saddex shaqooyin la sameeyo oo qoraal ah, kuwaas oo ah summarinta qoraalka, qoraalka hooseeya iyo turjumidda machine. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in modellkayagu uu si muhiim ah u muujiyaa saldhigyada aan automaamulka lahayn, wuxuuna gaadhaa tababar iskutar ah oo ku sameynaya tusaalooyin badan oo xoog badan oo madax u leh. Sidoo kale waxaynu sameynaa imtixaanka baaritaanka oo ballaadhan si aan u muujinno saamaynta kooxa la soo jeeday.", 'ur': 'غیر autoregressive generation (NAG) نے اچھے وقت اپنی سریع سرعت کے باعث بہت سی توجه اٹھایا ہے۔ لیکن موجود NAG موڈل کی نسل کی کیفیت ابھی ان کے ساتھیوں کے پیچھے چھوڑ رہی ہے۔ ہم اس کام میں دکھاتے ہیں کہ BERT ایک NAG موڈل کی پشت ہڈی کے طور پر کامل کر سکتے ہیں ایک بہت اچھی عملکرد کے لئے۔ اور زیادہ، ہم نے دو مکانیسموں کی تدبیر کر رکھی ہے کہ وانیلا NAG موڈل کے دو مشکلات کم کر دیں: پیش فرض اجلام کی طول کی غیر قابل توقع اور ایک ٹوکین کی پیش بینی کی مسئولیت کی غیر قابل توقع کریں۔ پیشنهاد مدل کی سرعت فائدہ مضبوط کرنے کے لئے، ہم ایک نئی ڈیکڈینگ استراتژی، رفایٹ-اول کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، جہاں اجلام کی طویل تقریباً پہلے مقرر کر سکتے ہیں. ایک محکم ارزیابی کے لئے، ہم تین ٹیکسٹ نسل کے کاموں پر پیشنهاد کی موڈل کی آزمائش کریں گے، یعنی ٹیکسٹ جمع کرنا، جمع کرنا اور ماشین ترجمہ کے ساتھ۔ Experimental results show that our model significantly outperforms existing non-autoregressive baselines and achieves competitive performance with many powerful autoregressive models. اس کے علاوہ، ہم نے ہر پیشنهاد رغبت کے اثر کو ظاہر کرنے کے لئے بڑی تحلیل کی آزمائش بھی کر رہے ہیں.', 'uz': "Yaqinda avto-regressiv avtomatik avtomatik avtomatik avtomatik avtomatik avval (NAG) tez tezlik tezligi sababda juda murakkab paydo beradi. However, the generation quality of existing NAG models still lags behind their autoregressive counterparts.  Bu ishda biz BERT bajarishni juda yaxshi o'xshash bajarish uchun NAG modeli bajarishi mumkin. Ko'pchilik, biz vanillar NAG modellarining ikkita umumiy muammolarni o'chirib chiqarish uchun ikkita mekani yaratib chiqaramiz: prefixed chiqarish uzunligi va oddiy teg oldingan holatning xossalari imkoniyati. Koʻrsatilgan modelning tezligini oshirish uchun, biz yangi kodlash strategiya, qiymati avval, natijalar uzunligi avval qiymati mumkin boʻlgan dasturlar uchun. Muddati qiymatda, biz uchta matn generalining vazifalarda rivojlanadigan modelni sinab ko'rayapmiz. Matn summary qilish, sentence kompression va mashinani tarjima qilish. Tajriba natijalari esa modelmiz mavjud emas autoregressiv asboblar natijalarini bajaradi va ko'pchilik ko'pchilik avto-regressiv modellar bilan rivojlanish natijasini bajaradi. Ko'pchilik, biz quyidagi qo'llangan komponentning effektini ko'rsatish uchun katta analyzerni bajaramiz.", 'vi': 'Gần đây hệ thống không có tự động đã thu hút rất nhiều sự chú ý nhờ tốc độ nhận ra nhanh chóng. Tuy nhiên, sản phẩm chất lượng của mô hình NASG bây giờ vẫn bám theo các khớp dao ngược. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi cho thấy BERT có thể được sử dụng làm xương sống của mô hình NASG cho một trình diễn cải thiện đáng kể. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi lập ra hai cơ chế để giảm bớt hai vấn đề chung của mô hình NASG vani: sự khó khăn của độ dài sản xuất hàng đầu và độ độc lập của dự đoán biểu tượng cá nhân. Để tăng thêm tốc độ thuận lợi cho mô hình đã đề xuất, chúng tôi đề xuất một chiến lược giải mã mới, tỉ số đầu tiên, cho các ứng dụng mà độ dài xuất có thể được đánh giá gần như trước. Để đánh giá toàn diện, chúng tôi thử nghiệm mô hình đã đề xuất về ba công việc sản xuất văn bản, gồm tổng hợp văn bản, ép bản và dịch cơ bản. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy mẫu của chúng ta đạt được khả năng cao hơn so với những bản mẫu không tự động còn sử dụng được. Chúng tôi cũng tiến hành các thí nghiệm phân tích đầy đủ để tiết lộ hiệu quả của mỗi thành phần được đề xuất.', 'bg': 'Неавторегресивното генериране (НАГ) наскоро привлече голямо внимание поради бързата си скорост на заключение. Въпреки това качеството на генерирането на съществуващите модели на НАГ все още изостава от авторегресивните си колеги. В тази работа показваме, че може да се използва като гръбнак на модел за значително подобрено представяне. Освен това разработваме два механизма за облекчаване на двата често срещани проблема на ваниловите модели: гъвкавостта на предварително фиксираната дължина на изхода и условната независимост на индивидуалните прогнози. За допълнително засилване на предимството на скоростта на предлагания модел предлагаме нова стратегия за декодиране, съотношение-първо, за приложения, при които изходните дължини могат да бъдат приблизително оценени предварително. За цялостна оценка тестваме предложения модел на три задачи за генериране на текст, включително обобщаване на текст, компресиране на изречения и машинен превод. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашият модел значително надминава съществуващите неавторегресивни базови линии и постига конкурентни резултати с много силни авторегресивни модели. Освен това провеждаме обширни експерименти за анализ, за да разкрием ефекта на всеки предложен компонент.', 'hr': 'Neautoregresivna generacija (NAG) nedavno je privukla veliku pažnju zbog brze brzine infekcije. Međutim, kvalitet generacije postojećih modela NAG još uvijek ostaje iza njihovih autoregresivnih kolega. U ovom poslu pokazujemo da se BERT može zaposliti kao leđa modela NAG-a za veoma poboljšan učinak. Osim toga, smislili smo dva mehanizma za smanjenje dva zajedničkog problema modela vanile NAG-a: nepoštovanje predviđene dužine izlaza i uvjetne nezavisnosti predviđanja pojedinih znakova. Da bismo dalje jačali prednost brzine predloženog model a, predlažemo novu strategiju za dekodiranje, odnos prvo, za aplikacije u kojima se dužina proizvoda može prije procijeniti približno. Za sveobuhvatnu procjenu, testiramo predloženi model na tri zadatka za generaciju teksta, uključujući sažetak teksta, kompresiju rečenica i prevod stroja. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model značajno iznosi postojeće neoregresivne osnovne linije i postigne konkurentne učinke sa mnogim jakim autoregresivnim modelima. Osim toga, mi također provodimo široke analize eksperimente kako bi otkrili učinak svakog predloženog komponenta.', 'da': 'Ikke-autoregressiv generation (NAG) har for nylig tiltrukket stor opmærksomhed på grund af sin hurtige inference hastighed. Generationskvaliteten af eksisterende NAG-modeller er imidlertid stadig bagud for deres autoregressive modstykker. I dette arbejde viser vi, at BERT kan anvendes som rygraden i en NAG-model for en stærkt forbedret ydeevne. Derudover udtænker vi to mekanismer til at afhjælpe de to fælles problemer med vanilje NAG-modeller: ufleksibiliteten af præfikset output længde og den betingede uafhængighed af individuelle token forudsigelser. For yderligere at styrke hastighedsfordelen ved den foreslåede model foreslår vi en ny afkodningsstrategi, ratio-first, for applikationer, hvor output længderne kan estimeres omtrent på forhånd. Til en omfattende evaluering tester vi den foreslåede model på tre tekstgenereringsopgaver, herunder tekstsammenfatning, sætningskompression og maskinoversættelse. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores model overgår eksisterende ikke-autoregressive baselines betydeligt og opnår konkurrencedygtig ydeevne med mange stærke autoregressive modeller. Derudover gennemfører vi også omfattende analyseekssperimenter for at afsløre effekten af hver foreslået komponent.', 'de': 'Nicht-autoregressive Erzeugung (NAG) hat in letzter Zeit aufgrund ihrer hohen Inferenzgeschwindigkeit große Aufmerksamkeit auf sich gezogen. Die Generierungsqualität bestehender NAG-Modelle liegt jedoch immer noch hinter ihren autoregressiven Pendants zurück. In dieser Arbeit zeigen wir, dass BERT als Rückgrat eines NAG-Modells für eine deutlich verbesserte Performance eingesetzt werden kann. Zusätzlich entwickeln wir zwei Mechanismen, um die beiden häufigsten Probleme von Vanilla NAG Modellen zu lindern: die Unflexibilität der präfixierten Output Länge und die bedingte Unabhängigkeit einzelner Token Vorhersagen. Um den Geschwindigkeitsvorteil des vorgeschlagenen Modells weiter zu stärken, schlagen wir eine neue Dekodierungsstrategie vor, Ratio-first, für Anwendungen, bei denen die Ausgangslängen ungefähr vorher geschätzt werden können. Für eine umfassende Evaluation testen wir das vorgeschlagene Modell an drei Textgenerierungsaufgaben, darunter Textzusammenfassung, Satzkomprimierung und maschinelle Übersetzung. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Modell bestehende nicht-autoregressive Basislinien deutlich übertrifft und mit vielen starken autoregressiven Modellen wettbewerbsfähige Leistungen erzielt. Darüber hinaus führen wir umfangreiche Analyseexperimente durch, um die Wirkung jeder vorgeschlagenen Komponente aufzudecken.', 'id': 'Generasi non-autoregressive (NAG) baru-baru ini menarik perhatian besar karena kecepatan keputusan yang cepat. Namun, kualitas generasi dari model NAG yang ada masih tertinggal di belakang rekan-rekan mereka. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami menunjukkan bahwa BERT dapat digunakan sebagai tulang belakang model NAG untuk prestasi yang jauh lebih baik. Additionally, we devise two mechanisms to alleviate the two common problems of vanilla NAG models: the inflexibility of prefixed output length and the conditional independence of individual token predictions.  Untuk memperkuat lebih lanjut keuntungan kecepatan dari model yang diusulkan, kami mengusulkan strategi dekoding baru, proporsi pertama, untuk aplikasi di mana panjang output bisa dikira sebelumnya. Untuk sebuah evaluasi komprensif, kami menguji model yang diusulkan pada tiga tugas generasi teks, termasuk ringkasan teks, kompresi kalimat dan terjemahan mesin. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa model kita jauh lebih besar dari garis dasar tidak-autoregresif yang ada dan mencapai prestasi kompetitif dengan banyak model autoregresif yang kuat. Selain itu, kami juga melakukan eksperimen analisis ekstensif untuk mengungkapkan efek dari setiap komponen yang diusulkan.', 'ko': '비자귀환생성(NAG)은 빠른 추리 속도 때문에 최근 들어 폭넓은 관심을 받고 있다.그러나 기존 NAG 모델의 생성 품질은 여전히 회귀 모델에 뒤떨어진다.이 작업에서, 우리는 버트가 NAG 모델의 핵심이 되어 성능을 크게 향상시킬 수 있음을 나타냈다.그 밖에 우리는 두 가지 메커니즘을 설계하여 vanilla NAG 모델의 두 가지 흔한 문제를 완화시켰다. 그것이 바로 접두사 출력 길이의 유연성과 단일 표기 예측의 조건 독립성이다.이 모델의 속도 우위를 더욱 강화하기 위해 우리는 새로운 디코딩 전략, 즉 비율 우선을 제기하여 출력 길이를 미리 근사하게 예측할 수 있는 응용에 사용했다.종합적인 평가를 위해 우리는 세 개의 텍스트 생성 임무에서 이 모델을 테스트했는데 텍스트 요약, 문장 압축과 기계 번역을 포함한다.실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 모델은 기존의 비자귀환 기선보다 현저히 우수하고 많은 강한 자귀환 모델과 경쟁력 있는 성능을 얻었다.그 밖에 우리는 모든 제안의 구성 부분의 영향을 밝히기 위해 광범위한 분석 실험을 진행했다.', 'sw': 'Kizazi kisichokuwa na ukandamizaji (NAG) hivi karibuni kilivutia hisia kubwa kwa sababu ya haraka ya ugonjwa wake. Hata hivyo, uzalishaji wa mifano ya NAG bado unabaki wapinzani wao wenyewe. Katika kazi hii, tunaonyesha kwamba BERT inaweza kutumika kama mgongo wa mtindo wa NAG kwa ajili ya utendaji ulioboreshwa sana. Kwa nyongeza, tunatengeneza mfumo miwili ili kupunguza matatizo mawili yanayofanana na mifano ya NAG: uhamasishaji wa uzito wa awali na uhuru wa hali ya juu wa utabiri binafsi. Ili kuongeza faida ya haraka ya muundo unaopendekezwa, tunapendekeza mkakati mpya wa decodi, kiwango cha kwanza, kwa matumizi ambayo muda mrefu wa matokeo yanaweza kuchukuliwa kama ilikadiriwa kabla. Kwa uchunguzi wa ujumla, tunajaribu modeli inayopendekezwa katika kazi tatu za vizazi vya maandishi, ikiwa ni pamoja na muhtasari wa maandishi, uangalizi wa hukumu na tafsiri ya mashine. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba mifano yetu inaonyesha kwa kiasi kikubwa unaoendelea kwenye misingi isiyo ya kudhibiti kujitegemea na kupata ufanisi wa ushindani na mifano mingi yenye nguvu ya kudhibiti. Zaidi ya hayo, tunafanya majaribio makubwa ya uchambuzi ili kuonyesha athari ya kila sehemu inayopendekezwa.', 'tr': "Otomatik ga첵d etme첵채n d철wletler (NAG) i흫 첵akynda tiz ga첵d etmek 체챌in gaty 체ns 챌ekdi. 횦철ne, bar NAG nusgalaryny흫 kalitesi h채li hem 철z-regressiv nusgalaryny흫 arkasynda gal첵ar. Bu i힊de, BERT'y흫 NAG nusgasy 체챌in 철r채n gowyla힊dyrylygy 체챌in i힊e yaranabilir di첵ip g철r체n첵채rdik. Ayr캇ca, vanilla NAG modellerinin iki ortak sorunu azaltmak i챌in iki mekanizma tasarland캇r캇yoruz: 철nizlenen 챌캇k캇힊 uzunlu휓unun etkile힊imlili휓ini ve 힊artl캇 token tahminlerinin 철zg체rl체휓체n체 azaltmak i챌in. 횜흫 teklip eden nusgany흫 tizliklerini gowamak 체챌in, t채ze bir k철dleme strateji첵asyny, ilkinji g철rn체힊 체챌in, 챌yky힊 uzyny흫 철흫체nden bellenil첵채r. T체m de흫lemek 체챌in, 체챌 metin bejermek 체챌in nusgany 체챌in barla첵arys. Metin sumla첵y힊y, s철zlemler sykylamak we ma힊yny흫 terjimesini dahil etmek 체챌in nusgasyny barla첵arys. Durman챌ylyk netijelerimiz bizi흫 nusgymyzy흫 bolan awtomatik-regressiv tabanlyklary흫 체st체nden 챌ykaryp bar첵andygyny g철rkez첵채r we k철p g체첵챌li awtomatik-regressiv nusgalary흫 bilen t채sirli etkinlik ukyplaryny 첵e흫 Munu흫 체챌in hem bu teklip eden komponenti흫 t채sirini g철rkezmek 체챌in 철r채n uly 챌철z체mler deneyleri etdik.", 'fa': 'نسل غیر خودگریسی (NAG) اخیرا توجه بسیار زیادی به سبب سرعت آلودگی سریع خود جذب کرده است. با این حال، کیفیت نسل مدلهای NAG موجود هنوز پشت همکاران خودگریسی خود را باقی مانده است. در این کار، ما نشان می دهیم که BERT می تواند به عنوان استخوان پشتیبانی یک مدل NAG برای انجام بسیار بهتر شده استخدام شود. علاوه بر این، ما دو مکانیسم را برای کمبود کردن دو مشکل مشترک مدل NAG وینیلا ساختیم: قابلیت درازی پیش\u200cفرض و مستقل مستقل پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای نشانه\u200cهای فردی. برای further strengthening the speed advantage of the proposed model, we propose a new decoding strategy, ratio-first, for applications where the output lengths can be estimated approximately before. برای یک ارزیابی کامل، ما مدل پیشنهاد را بر سه کار نسل متن آزمایش می کنیم، شامل جمع کردن متن، جمع کردن جمله و ترجمه دستگاه. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cی ما نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما خیلی بیشتر از خط\u200cهای پایگاه\u200cهای غیر خودگریزی\u200cکننده\u200cای انجام می\u200cدهد و به انجام رقابت با مدل\u200cهای بسیاری قوی خودگریزی می\u200cرسد. در addition, we also conduct extensive analysis experiments to reveal the effect of each proposed component.', 'sq': 'Gjenerata jo-autoregressive (NAG) ka tërhequr kohët e fundit vëmendje të madhe për shkak të shpejtësisë së saj të përfundimit. Megjithatë, cilësia e gjeneratës së modeleve ekzistuese të NAG-së mbetet ende prapa homologëve të tyre autoregressive. Në këtë punë, ne tregojmë se BERT mund të përdoret si shpina e një modeli NAG për një shfaqje shumë të përmirësuar. Përveç kësaj, ne krijojmë dy mekanizma për të lehtësuar dy problemet e përbashkëta të modeleve të vanilës NAG: pafleksibilitetin e gjatësisë së paracaktuar të daljes dhe pavarësinë kushtuese të parashikimeve individuale të token. Për të forcuar më tej avantazhin e shpejtësisë së modelit të propozuar, ne propozojmë një strategji të re dekodimi, raporti-së pari, për aplikimet ku gjatësia e daljes mund të vlerësohet afërsisht më parë. Për një vlerësim tërësor, ne testojmë modelin e propozuar në tre detyra të gjenerimit të tekstit, duke përfshirë përmbledhjen e tekstit, kompresionin e fjalëve dhe përkthimin e makinave. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se modeli ynë tejkalon ndjeshëm linjat bazë ekzistuese jo-autoregressive dhe arrin performancë konkurruese me shumë modele të forta autoregressive. Përveç kësaj, ne kryejmë gjithashtu eksperimente të gjerë analize për të zbuluar efektin e çdo komponenti të propozuar.', 'nl': 'Niet-autoregressieve generatie (NAG) heeft onlangs veel aandacht getrokken vanwege de snelle inferentiesnelheid. De generatiekwaliteit van bestaande NAG-modellen loopt echter nog steeds achter op hun autoregressieve tegenhangers. In dit werk laten we zien dat BERT ingezet kan worden als ruggengraat van een NAG model voor een sterk verbeterde prestaties. Daarnaast ontwikkelen we twee mechanismen om de twee veelvoorkomende problemen van vanille NAG modellen te verlichten: de inflexibiliteit van vooraf bepaalde outputlengte en de voorwaardelijke onafhankelijkheid van individuele tokenvoorspellingen. Om het snelheidsvoordeel van het voorgestelde model verder te versterken, stellen we een nieuwe decoderingsstrategie voor, ratio-first, voor toepassingen waarbij de outputlengtes vooraf ongeveer geschat kunnen worden. Voor een uitgebreide evaluatie testen we het voorgestelde model op drie tekstgeneratietaken, waaronder tekstsamenvatting, zinscompressie en machinevertaling. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat ons model aanzienlijk beter presteert dan bestaande niet-autoregressieve basislijnen en concurrerende prestaties behaalt met veel sterke autoregressieve modellen. Daarnaast voeren we ook uitgebreide analyseexperimenten uit om het effect van elke voorgestelde component te onthullen.', 'af': "Nie-autoregressiewe generasie (NAG) het onlangs groot aandag aangedra vanweë sy vinnige inferensie spoed. Maar die generasie-kwaliteit van bestaande NAG-modelles bly nog agter hul autoregressiewe kunstenaars. In hierdie werk, wys ons dat BERT as die bakbone van 'n NAG model vir 'n groot verbeterde prestasie kan word. In addition, we devise two mechanisms to alleviate the two common problems of vanilla NAG models: the inflexibility of prefixed output length and the conditional independence of individual token predictions. Om die spoedvoordeel van die voorgestelde model verder te versterk, voorstel ons 'n nuwe dekoderingsstrategie, verhouding-eerste, vir toepassings waar die uitvoer lengte omtrent vooraf bereken kan word. Vir 'n kompleks evaluering, toets ons die voorgestelde model op drie teks generasie taak, insluitend teks opsomming, sentence komprimering en masjien vertaling. Eksperimentele resultate wys dat ons model betekeurig uitvoer bestaande nie-autoregressiewe basisline en bereik rekenaktiewe prestasie met baie sterke autoregressiewe modele. In addition, we also conduct extensive analysis experiments to reveal the effect of each proposed component.", 'az': 'Otomatik-regressiv nəsil (NAG) son zamanlarda hızlı infeksiya sürətinə görə böyük dikkati çekmişdir. Halbuki, NAG modellərin nəsili hələ də öz autoregressiv yoldaşlarının arxasında qalar. Bu işdə, BERT çox yaxşılaşdırılmış performans üçün NAG modeli kimi istifadə edilə bilər. Əksinə, vanilla NAG modellərin iki ortaq problemlərini azaltmaq üçün iki mehānismu yaratdıq: prefiks çıxış uzunluğunun və individu token tədbirlərinin müəyyən edilməsi üçün müəyyən edilməsi. Öndərilən modelinin hızlı faydalarını daha da artırmaq üçün yeni kodlama stratejisini, ilk dəfə, çıxış uzunluğunu yaxın əvvəl təmin edə biləcək proqramlar üçün təklif edirik. Tüm değerlendirmə üçün, təklif etdiyimiz modeli üç metin ürəklərinin işlərini sınağa çəkirik, metin yığışdırması, cümlələr sıkıştırması və maşına çevirilməsi də dahil edirik. Həqiqətən, təcrübə sonuçlarımız modellərimizin mevcut olmayan autoregressiv səhifələrindən çox çox möhkəm autoregressiv modellərlə müqayisəçi performansını başa çatdığını göstərir. Biz də təklif etdiyimiz hər komponentin etkisini göstərmək üçün geniş analiz təcrübələrini təşkil edirik.', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয় প্রজন্ম (NAG) সম্প্রতি তার দ্রুত দুর্ভোগের গতির কারণে দ্রুত মনোযোগ আকর্ষণ করেছে। তবে বিদ্যমান NAG মডেলের প্রজন্মের মান এখনো তাদের স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্রতিপক্ষের পিছনে রেখে আছে। এই কাজের মধ্যে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে বেরেট ব্যবহার করা যাবে ন্যাজি মডেলের পেছনের হাত হিসেবে। এছাড়াও আমরা দুটি মেকানিস্তান করেছি ভ্যানিলা ন্যাজি মডেলের দুটি সাধারণ সমস্যা কমিয়ে দেবার জন্য: পূর্বনির্ধারিত আউটপুটের দীর্ঘদিনের প্রভ প্রস্তাবিত মডেলের গতির সুবিধা আরো শক্তিশালী করার জন্য আমরা একটি নতুন ডিকোডিং কৌশল, রেটো- প্রথমে প্রস্তাব করি, যেখানে আউটপুটের দীর্ঘদিন আগে হিসে একটি সম্পূর্ণ মূল্যের জন্য আমরা প্রস্তাবিত মডেল তিন টেক্সট প্রজন্মের কাজে পরীক্ষা করি, যার মধ্যে লেখা সারসংক্ষেপ, শাস্তি সম্প পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল অনেক শক্তিশালী স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে নিয়ন্ত্রণের বেসাইনের ব্যাপারে প্রতিযোগিতা প্রদর্শন করে এব এছাড়াও আমরা প্রস্তাবিত প্রতিটি অংশের প্রভাব প্রকাশের জন্য বিস্তারিত বিশ্লেষণ পরীক্ষা করি।', 'hy': "Ներջերս ոչ ինքնասեփական սերունդը (NAG) շատ ուշադրություն է դարձրել իր արագ հետևողության արագության պատճառով: Այնուամենայնիվ, գոյություն ունեցող ՆԱԳ մոդելների սերունդի որակը դեռևս մնում է իրենց ավտոռեգրեսիվ գործընկերների ետևում: Այս աշխատանքում մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ BER-ը կարող է օգտագործվել որպես NAG-ի մոդելի մեծ բարելավման համար: Ավելին, մենք երկու մեխանիզմներ ենք ստեղծում, որպեսզի նվազեցնենք վանիլայի NAG մոդելների երկու ընդհանուր խնդիրները' նախախախառնված արտադրության երկարության անճկունությունը և անհատական նշանների կանխատեսումների պայմանավոր անկախությունը Որպեսզի ավելի ուժեղացնենք առաջարկված մոդելի արագության առավելությունը, մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր կոդավորման ռազմավարություն, հարաբերակցություն-առաջին, ծրագրերի համար, որտեղ արտադրության երկարությունը կարող է նախկինում մոտավորապես հաշվարկվել: Ամբողջ գնահատման համար մենք փորձում ենք առաջարկված մոդելը երեք տեքստի ստեղծման առաջադրանքների վրա, ներառյալ տեքստի համառոտագրությունը, նախադասությունների ճնշումը և մեքենային թարգմանությունը: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում է գոյություն ունեցող ոչ ինքնաարձագանքային հիմքերը և հասնում է մրցակցության արդյունքների շատ ուժեղ ինքնաարձագանքային մոդելների Ավելին, մենք նաև կատարում ենք էքսպենսիվ վերլուծության փորձեր, որպեսզի բացահայտենք յուրաքանչյուր առաջարկված բաղադրամի ազդեցությունը:", 'ca': "Non-autoregressive generation (NAG) has recently attracted great attention due to its fast inference speed.  Tot i així, la qualitat de generació dels models NAG existents encara queda darrere dels seus homosexuals autoregressius. En aquest treball, demostram que el BERT pot ser utilitzat com a columna vertebral d'un model NAG per a un rendiment molt millorat. A més, dissenyem dos mecanismes per aliviar els dos problemes comuns dels models de vanilla NAG: la inflexibilitat de la llargada de producció prefixada i la independència condicional de les prediccions individuals de fitxes. To further strengthen the speed advantage of the proposed model, we propose a new decoding strategy, ratio-first, for applications where the output lengths can be approximately estimated beforehand.  Per una evaluació completa, provem el model proposat en tres tasques de generació de text, incloent resum de text, compressió de frases i traducció màquina. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre model supera significativament les línies de base no autoregressives existents i aconsegueix un rendiment competitiu amb molts models autoregressius forts. A més, també fem experiments d'anàlisi extensos per revelar l'efecte de cada component proposat.", 'cs': 'Neautoregresivní generace (NAG) v poslední době upoutala velkou pozornost díky své rychlosti inference. Generační kvalita stávajících modelů NAG však stále zaostává za autoregresivními protějšky. V této práci ukazujeme, že BERT lze použít jako páteř modelu NAG pro výrazně zlepšení výkonu. Navíc navrhujeme dva mechanismy pro zmírnění dvou běžných problémů vanilkových NAG modelů: nepružnost prefixované délky výstupu a podmíněná nezávislost jednotlivých tokenových predikcí. Pro další posílení rychlostní výhody navrženého modelu navrhujeme novou dekódovací strategii, ratio-first, pro aplikace, kde lze přibližně předem odhadnout délky výstupu. Pro komplexní vyhodnocení testujeme navržený model na třech úlohách generace textu, včetně souhrnu textu, komprese vět a strojového překladu. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš model výrazně překonává stávající non-autoregresivní základní linie a dosahuje konkurenčního výkonu s mnoha silnými autoregresivními modely. Kromě toho provádíme rozsáhlé analytické experimenty, abychom odhalili účinek každé navrhované složky.', 'bs': 'Neautoregresivna generacija (NAG) nedavno je privukla veliku pažnju zbog brze brzine infekcije. Međutim, kvalitet generacije postojećih modela NAG još uvijek ostaje iza njihovih autoregresivnih kolega. U ovom poslu pokazujemo da se BERT može zaposliti kao kost model a NAG-a za veoma poboljšanu izvedbu. Osim toga, smislili smo dva mehanizma da ublažimo dva zajednička problema modela vanile NAG-a: neprihvatljivost predviđene dužine izlaza i uvjetne nezavisnosti predviđanja pojedinaca. Da bismo dalje jačali prednost brzine predloženog model a, predlažemo novu strategiju za dekodiranje, odnos prvo, za aplikacije u kojima se dužina izlaza može prije procijeniti približno. Za sveobuhvatnu procjenu, testiramo predloženi model na tri zadatka za generaciju teksta, uključujući sažetak teksta, kompresiju rečenica i prevod stroja. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model značajno iznosi postojeće neoregresivne osnovne linije i postigne konkurentne funkcije sa mnogim jakim autoregresivnim modelima. Osim toga, mi također provodimo široke analize eksperimente kako bi otkrili učinak svakog predloženog komponenta.', 'am': 'የአፍሪካዊ ትውልድ (NAG) በቅርብ ጊዜ የፍጥረት ውጤት ምክንያት እጅግ ትኩረትን አቀረበ፡፡ ነገር ግን የኖረው NAG model ጥያቄ ገና በራሱ አካባቢ ተቃውሞ ይኖራል፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ BERT እንደተሻለ የNAG ሞዴል መሆኑን እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የውይይት የNAG ዓይነቶች ሁለትን የተለየውን ሙሉ ጉዳዮች ለማቅረብ ሁለት ምኮናዎች እና የግንኙነት የግንኙነት የግንኙነት ግንኙነት እና የግንኙነት የግንኙነት ግንኙነት ለመፍጠር እናደርጋለን፡፡ ለመፈለግ የሞዴል ፈጥኖ ጥቅም ለመጨመር፣ አዲስ የድምፅ ቁጥጥር፣ ፍጥረቱ ርዝመት አስቀድሞ ለመቆጠር ለሚችሉበት ፕሮግራሞች አዲስ ጥቅምት እናሳስባታለን፡፡ ለሙሉ ማስታወቂያ፣ የጽሑፍ አቀማመጥ፣ የጽሑፍ ክፍል እና የመሳሳይ ትርጉም እና የተፈጸመውን ሞዴል በሦስት ትውልድ ትውልድ ስራዎችን እናሞክራለን፡፡ ፈተና ፍሬዎች ሞዴሌዎቻችን የሥልጣን አካባቢ መደገፊያዎችን በኩል የሚያሳየው እናም በብዙ ኃይለኛ የራሳቸውን አካባቢ ምሳሌዎች የሚያደርግ ፍሬታዎችን ያገኛል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የሁሉንም አካባቢ ክፍል ለማሳየት የምናስፈልገውን ትልቅ ምርጫዎች እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'fi': 'Non-autoregressive generation (NAG) on viime aikoina herättänyt suurta huomiota nopean päättelynopeudensa vuoksi. Nykyisten NAG-mallien tuotannon laatu on kuitenkin edelleen jäljessä autoregressiivisistä malleista. Tässä työssä osoitetaan, että BERT voidaan käyttää NAG-mallin selkärankana huomattavasti paremman suorituskyvyn saavuttamiseksi. Lisäksi kehitämme kaksi mekanismia lievittämään vaniljan NAG-mallien kahta yleistä ongelmaa: etuliitetyn tuotoksen pituuden joustamattomuutta ja yksittäisten merkkien ennusteiden ehdollista riippumattomuutta. Ehdotetun mallin nopeuteen liittyvän edun vahvistamiseksi ehdotamme uutta dekooderistrategiaa, ratio-first, sovelluksiin, joissa lähtöpituudet voidaan arvioida arviolta etukäteen. Kattavaa arviointia varten testaamme ehdotettua mallia kolmella tekstintuotantotehtävällä, mukaan lukien tekstin yhteenveto, lauseiden pakkaaminen ja konekäännös. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että mallimme suoriutuu merkittävästi nykyisistä ei-autoregressiivisista lähtökohdista ja saavuttaa kilpailukykyisen suorituskyvyn monilla vahvoilla autoregressiivisilla malleilla. Lisäksi teemme laajoja analyysikokeita kunkin ehdotetun komponentin vaikutuksen paljastamiseksi.', 'et': 'Mitte-autoregressiivne generatsioon (NAG) on viimasel ajal pööranud suurt tähelepanu oma kiire järelduskiiruse tõttu. Olemasolevate riiklike tegevusjuhiste mudelite tootmise kvaliteet jääb siiski autoregressiivsetest mudelitest maha. Käesolevas töös näitame, et BERT-i saab kasutada NAG mudeli selgrooga oluliselt parema jõudluse saavutamiseks. Lisaks töötame välja kaks mehhanismi, et leevendada vanilje NAG mudelite kahte levinud probleemi: eelfikseeritud väljundpikkuse paindumatus ja individuaalsete märgiste prognooside tingimuslik sõltumatus. Kavandatud mudeli kiiruseelise veelgi tugevdamiseks pakume välja uue dekodeerimisstrateegia, proportsioon-first, rakendustele, kus väljundpikkusi saab eelnevalt ligikaudu hinnata. Põhjalikuks hindamiseks testime pakutud mudelit kolmel tekstigeneratsiooni ülesandel, sealhulgas teksti kokkuvõtlikul kujul, lausete tihendamisel ja masintõlkel. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie mudel ületab oluliselt olemasolevaid mitteagregressiivseid lähtejooni ja saavutab konkurentsivõimelise jõudluse paljude tugevate autorregressiivsete mudelitega. Lisaks teostame ulatuslikke analüüsikatseid, et selgitada välja iga kavandatud komponendi mõju.', 'he': 'Non-autoregressive generation (NAG) has recently attracted great attention due to its fast inference speed.  בכל אופן, איכות הדור של דוגמנים NAG קיימים עדיין מאחורי השותפים האוטומגרסיבים שלהם. בעבודה הזאת, אנו מראים שברט אפשר להשתמש בתור עצמת גב של מודל NAG עבור ביצוע משתפר מאוד. Additionally, we devise two mechanisms to alleviate the two common problems of vanilla NAG models: the inflexibility of prefixed output length and the conditional independence of individual token predictions.  כדי לחזק עוד את יתרון המהירות של המודל המוצע, אנו מציעים אסטרטגיה חדשה לפענוח, יחס ראשון, עבור היישומים שבו אורך ההוצאה יכול להעריך בערך מראש. For a comprehensive evaluation, we test the proposed model on three text generation tasks, including text summarization, sentence compression and machine translation.  Experimental results show that our model significantly outperforms existing non-autoregressive baselines and achieves competitive performance with many strong autoregressive models.  In addition, we also conduct extensive analysis experiments to reveal the effect of each proposed component.', 'sk': 'Neavtoregresivna generacija (NAG) je v zadnjem času pritegnila veliko pozornosti zaradi hitre sklepne hitrosti. Vendar pa kakovost proizvodnje obstoječih modelov NAG še vedno zaostaja za njihovimi avtoregresivnimi modeli. V tem delu smo pokazali, da je BERT mogoče uporabiti kot hrbtenica modela NAG za močno izboljšano zmogljivost. Poleg tega smo oblikovali dva mehanizma za ublažitev dveh pogostih problemov vanilijevih NAG modelov: nefleksibilnost predhodne dolžine izhoda in pogojno neodvisnost posameznih napovedi žetonov. Za nadaljnjo okrepitev prednosti hitrosti predlaganega modela predlagamo novo strategijo dekodiranja, razmerje-prvo, za aplikacije, kjer je mogoče izhodne dolžine oceniti približno vnaprej. Za celovito oceno smo predlagani model testirali na treh nalogah generiranja besedila, vključno s povzetkom besedila, stiskanjem stavkov in strojnim prevajanjem. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da je naš model bistveno boljši od obstoječih ne-avtoregresivnih osnovnih linij in dosega konkurenčno zmogljivost s številnimi močnimi avtoregresivnimi modeli. Poleg tega izvajamo tudi obsežne analitske poskuse, da razkrijemo učinek vsake predlagane komponente.', 'bo': 'རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་མིན་པའི་མི་རབས་པ(NAG)དེ་བས་ཀྱིས་མྱུར་བའི་འགྱུར་ཚད་ལ་ཉེ་ཆར་བར་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། ད་ལྟ་བུའི་མི་དབྱིབས་དཔེ་གཞུང་གི་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་གྲངས་ཀ་དེ་ནམ་ཡང་ཁོང་ཚོའི་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་མཁ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་BERT་ནི་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་གྱི་མིག་དཔེ་ལ་རྒྱབ་ལྗོངས་ཀྱི་སྤྱོད་སྟངས་མང་ཙམ་བཟོ་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན་ན་འོང་། Additionally, we devise two mechanisms to alleviate the common problems of vanilla NAG models: the inflexibility of prefixed output length and the conditional independence of individual token predictions. To further strengthen the speed advantage of the proposed model, we propose a new decoding strategy, ratio-first, for applications where the output length can be approximately estimated before. comprehensive evaluation, we test the proposed model on three text generation tasks, including text summarization, sentence compression and machine translation. Experimental results show that our model significantly outperforms existing non-autoregressive baselines and achieves competitive performance with many strong autoregressive models. ད་དུང་། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་རེ་རེར་སྤྲོད་པའི་ཆ་ཤས་གཅིག་གི་གནོད་པ་གསལ་བཤད་ནི་ལྟ་བུ་རེད།', 'jv': 'Gak-autoRegresno Panjenengan (NG) sing dumadhi butakon seneng pisan seneng pisan seneng pisan seneng nggalakno kaya basan seneng pisan banget. Nanging, kalite lah sampeyan model NaG sing isih dumadhi iki bakal kelas perusahaan segala perusahaan karo perusahaan Nang barêng-barêng iki, kita ngomong nik BERT iso dianggapaké kaya nguasar dumadhi bingi, nik model NaG dumadhi kanggo ngerasakno sing luwih apik. Mungkin ndi, awak dhéwé iso nggawe sistem duwé kanggo nyenggawe perbudhakan langgar sampeyan karo model sing bakal dumadhi sing bakal gerakan: perbudhakan kanggo nyenggawe sistem sing apik dhéwé lan akeh nyong nggawe gerakan sampeyan (token) sing apik dhéwé. Mbak nggawe luwih-luwih sing dibutuhke sistem sing dianggawe model, kéné gunakake sistem sing gawe decoding, ratio-first, kanggo aplikasi sing bisa diantesik katêpakan langgar output iso dianggonane Tulung mbok sing akeh gunakake Rejalaké sing paling dhéwé kuwi model sing ngendalikno akeh iso nggawe barang-autoRegresor barang lan gawe barang akeh operasi sing beraksi ngono akeh model sing nêmêr autoRegresor. Nambah, awak dhéwé ngerasakno éntuk akeh pancening kapan kawit neng ngono nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe sapa kompon sing apik dhéwé.', 'ha': "QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu A lokacin da, girgije na tsarin misãlai na NAG wanda ke gaba yana baka bakin tarakin da farat ɗaya. Daga wannan aikin, Munã nũna wa BERT za a yi amfani da shi kamar bakin wani misalin NAG wa mai kyãwo mai kyau. Ina ƙara, za'a ƙayyade sauri masu matsayi biyu na ɗayan masĩfun misãlai biyu na NAG masu bakwai: mai muhimmanci ga zaman ƙayyade matsayi da kuma da halin da ba'a ƙayyade wa'adi na ɗabi'a. To, dõmin Mu ƙara fartawa ga misali da aka buƙata, sai mu buƙata wani taki na kodi, da rabo-kwance, wa shiryoyin ayuka da za'a iya ƙayyade cire tsawo a gabani. Ko da hakki, muna jarraba misalin wanda aka ƙayyade wa aikin matsayi uku, kamar ƙararin matsayi, ƙarami da kuma fassarar maɓalli. Matarin jarrabai ke nuna cewa misalinmu yana ƙara bayani na masu da basasalin ba-kandamati kuma yana sãmu mai ƙidido da wasu misãlai masu ƙarfi masu ƙarfi. Da wannan, Munã samun jarrabai masu ƙaranci dõmin su bayyana mai amfani ga duk compound da aka buƙata."}
{'en': 'CD2CR : Co-reference resolution across documents and domains', 'es': 'CD2CR: Resolución de correferencia en documentos y dominios', 'fr': 'CD2CR\xa0: résolution de coréférence entre les documents et les domaines', 'ar': 'CD2CR: تحليل المرجع المشترك عبر المستندات والمجالات', 'pt': 'CD2CR: Resolução de co-referência entre documentos e domínios', 'ja': 'CD 2 CR ：ドキュメントとドメイン間の共参照解決', 'hi': 'CD2CR: दस्तावेज़ों और डोमेन में सह-संदर्भ रिज़ॉल्यूशन', 'zh': 'CD2CR:跨文档和域协引解析', 'ru': 'CD2CR: совместное разрешение ссылок на документы и домены', 'ga': 'CD2CR: Taifeach comhthagartha trasna doiciméad agus fearainn', 'el': 'Επίλυση συναπόφασης μεταξύ εγγράφων και τομέων', 'ka': 'CD2CR: დოკუმენტების და დომენტების განსაზღვრება', 'hu': 'CD2CR: Társhivatkozási felbontás dokumentumok és tartományok között', 'it': 'CD2CR: risoluzione di co-riferimento tra documenti e domini', 'kk': 'CD2CR: Құжаттар мен домендер арасында бір сілтеме айырмашылығы', 'lt': 'CD2CR: Bendra nuoroda į rezoliuciją įvairiuose dokumentuose ir srityse', 'mk': 'CD2CR: Кореференциска резолуција низ документите и домените', 'ml': 'സിഡി2CR: രേഖകളും ഡോമെന്\u200dസുകളും മുകളില്\u200d കോപ്പരെന്\u200dസ് റിസ്റ്റല്\u200d', 'ms': 'CD2CR: Resolusi rujukan-sama melalui dokumen dan domain', 'mt': 'CD2CR: Riżoluzzjoni ta’ koreferenza bejn id-dokumenti u d-dominji', 'ro': 'CD2CR: Rezoluția corespondenței între documente și domenii', 'mn': 'CD2CR', 'no': 'CD2CR: Koreferansløysing over dokument og domene', 'pl': 'CD2CR: Rozwiązanie współreferencyjne w dokumentach i domenach', 'sr': 'CD2CR: Резолюција кореференције преко документа и домена', 'so': 'CD2CR: Heshiiska qof-reference ee dukumentiyada iyo deegaanka', 'sv': 'CD2CR: Samreferensupplösning mellan dokument och domäner', 'si': 'CD2CR: දස්තාව සහ ඩෝමේන් වලට සම්බන්ධ විශේෂණය', 'ta': 'CD2CR: ஆவணங்கள் மற்றும் களங்களுக்கு மேல் Co- reference resolution', 'ur': 'CD2CR: دکھانے اور ڈومین کے درمیان مشترک روشنی', 'uz': 'CD2CR: Ҳужжатлар ва доменлар орасида koʻproq reference resolution', 'vi': 'C2CR: Có tín hiệu đồng bộ về tài liệu và miền', 'nl': 'CD2CR: Co-referentie resolutie over documenten en domeinen', 'da': 'CD2CR: Fælles referenceopløsning på tværs af dokumenter og domæner', 'bg': 'CD2CR: Съответна резолюция между документи и домейни', 'de': 'CD2CR: Co-Reference Resolution über Dokumente und Domänen hinweg', 'id': 'CD2CR: Co-reference resolution across documents and domains', 'ko': 'CD2CR: 문서 및 도메인 간의 공통 참조 확인', 'sw': 'CD2CR: Uamuzi wa Umoja wa Matangazo katika nyaraka na maeneo', 'tr': 'CD2CR: Senedler we alanlar arasynda çözümleşme', 'af': 'CD2CR: Koverwysing oplossing oor dokumente en domeine', 'am': 'CR:', 'fa': 'CD2CR: راه حل همکاری در طول سند و دامنه\u200cها', 'az': '䑃䌲㩒䐠뛃썫涼쥬犙瘠駉搠浯湥쥬犙愠慲쑳溱慤씠즟殙汩쌠즧殙汩쥭玙੩', 'sq': 'CD2CR: Zgjidhje bashkëreference nëpërmjet dokumenteve dhe domeneve', 'hy': 'CD2CK. Կոհամեջբերման լուծում փաստաթղթերի և բնագավառների միջև', 'bs': 'CD2CR: Rezolucija saradnje preko dokumenta i domena', 'bn': 'CD2CR: Co-reference resolution across documents and domains', 'hr': 'CD2CR: Rezolucija saradnje preko dokumenta i domena', 'cs': 'CD2CR: Řešení společných referencí napříč dokumenty a doménami', 'ca': 'CD2CR: Resolució de co-referència entre documents i dominis', 'et': 'CD2CR: dokumentide ja valdkondade vaheline resolutsioon', 'fi': 'CD2CR: Asiakirjojen ja toimialojen välinen yhteisvertailu', 'jv': 'paper size', 'sk': 'CD2CR: Soreferenčna ločljivost med dokumenti in področji', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'CD2CR: פתרון התייחסות בין מסמכים ותחומים', 'bo': 'CD2CR: ཡིག་ཆའི་དང་གནས་ཁོངས་ལ་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Cross-document co-reference resolution (CDCR) is the task of identifying and linking mentions to entities and concepts across many text documents. Current state-of-the-art models for this task assume that all documents are of the same type (e.g. news articles) or fall under the same theme. However, it is also desirable to perform CDCR across different domains (type or theme). A particular use case we focus on in this paper is the resolution of entities mentioned across scientific work and newspaper articles that discuss them. Identifying the same entities and corresponding concepts in both scientific articles and news can help scientists understand how their work is represented in mainstream media. We propose a new task and English language dataset for cross-document cross-domain co-reference resolution (CD2CR). The task aims to identify links between entities across heterogeneous document types. We show that in this cross-domain, cross-document setting, existing CDCR models do not perform well and we provide a baseline model that outperforms current state-of-the-art CDCR models on CD2CR. Our data set, annotation tool and guidelines as well as our model for cross-document cross-domain co-reference are all supplied as open access open source resources.', 'fr': "La résolution de coréférence entre documents (CDCR) est la tâche d'identifier et de relier les mentions aux entités et aux concepts dans de nombreux documents texte. Les modèles actuels de pointe pour cette tâche supposent que tous les documents sont du même type (par exemple les articles de presse) ou relèvent du même thème. Cependant, il est également souhaitable d'effectuer un CDCR dans différents domaines (type ou thème). Un cas d'utilisation particulier sur lequel nous nous concentrons dans cet article est la résolution des entités mentionnées dans les travaux scientifiques et les articles de journaux qui en parlent. L'identification des mêmes entités et des concepts correspondants dans les articles scientifiques et les actualités peut aider les scientifiques à comprendre comment leurs travaux sont représentés dans les médias traditionnels. Nous proposons une nouvelle tâche et un jeu de données en anglais pour la résolution de coréférence inter-domaines entre documents (CD2CR). La tâche vise à identifier les liens entre les entités au sein de types de documents hétérogènes. Nous montrons que dans ce contexte inter-domaines et documents croisés, les modèles CDCR existants ne fonctionnent pas bien et nous fournissons un modèle de base qui surpasse les modèles CDCR de pointe actuels sur CD2CR. Notre ensemble de données, notre outil d'annotation et nos directives ainsi que notre modèle de coréférence inter-documents entre domaines sont tous fournis sous forme de ressources open source en libre accès.", 'ar': 'قرار الإسناد المشترك للوثائق (CDCR) هو مهمة تحديد وربط الإشارات بالكيانات والمفاهيم عبر العديد من المستندات النصية. تفترض أحدث النماذج الحالية لهذه المهمة أن جميع المستندات من نفس النوع (مثل المقالات الإخبارية) أو تندرج تحت نفس الموضوع. ومع ذلك ، فمن المستحسن أيضًا تنفيذ CDCR عبر مجالات مختلفة (النوع أو الموضوع). حالة استخدام معينة نركز عليها في هذه الورقة هي حل الكيانات المذكورة عبر العمل العلمي والمقالات الصحفية التي تناقشها. يمكن أن يساعد تحديد الكيانات نفسها والمفاهيم المقابلة في كل من المقالات العلمية والأخبار العلماء على فهم كيفية تمثيل عملهم في وسائل الإعلام الرئيسية. نقترح مهمة جديدة ومجموعة بيانات باللغة الإنجليزية من أجل حل المرجع المشترك عبر المجال (CD2CR). تهدف المهمة إلى تحديد الروابط بين الكيانات عبر أنواع المستندات غير المتجانسة. نوضح أنه في هذا الإعداد عبر المجال والوثائق المتقاطعة ، لا تعمل نماذج CDCR الحالية بشكل جيد ونقدم نموذجًا أساسيًا يتفوق على أحدث طرازات CDCR الحالية على CD2CR. يتم توفير مجموعة البيانات الخاصة بنا ، وأداة التعليقات التوضيحية والإرشادات بالإضافة إلى نموذجنا الخاص بالمرجع المشترك عبر المجال عبر المستندات ، كموارد مفتوحة المصدر مفتوحة المصدر.', 'es': 'La resolución de correferencia entre documentos (CDCR) es la tarea de identificar y vincular menciones a entidades y conceptos en muchos documentos de texto. Los modelos actuales de vanguardia para esta tarea suponen que todos los documentos son del mismo tipo (por ejemplo, artículos de noticias) o pertenecen al mismo tema. Sin embargo, también es deseable realizar CDCR en diferentes dominios (tipo o tema). Un caso de uso particular en el que nos centramos en este artículo es la resolución de las entidades mencionadas en el trabajo científico y en los artículos periodísticos que las discuten. Identificar las mismas entidades y los conceptos correspondientes tanto en artículos científicos como en noticias puede ayudar a los científicos a entender cómo se representa su trabajo en los principales medios de comunicación. Proponemos una nueva tarea y un conjunto de datos en inglés para la resolución de correferencias entre documentos (CD2CR). La tarea tiene como objetivo identificar los vínculos entre entidades a través de tipos de documentos heterogéneos. Demostramos que en este entorno entre dominios y documentos cruzados, los modelos CDCR existentes no funcionan bien y proporcionamos un modelo de referencia que supera a los modelos CDCR actuales de última generación en CD2CR. Nuestro conjunto de datos, la herramienta de anotación y las directrices, así como nuestro modelo de correferencia entre documentos entre dominios, se proporcionan como recursos de código abierto de acceso abierto.', 'pt': 'A resolução de co-referência entre documentos (CCR) é a tarefa de identificar e vincular menções a entidades e conceitos em muitos documentos de texto. Os modelos atuais de última geração para esta tarefa pressupõem que todos os documentos são do mesmo tipo (por exemplo, artigos de notícias) ou se enquadram no mesmo tema. No entanto, também é desejável executar o CDCR em diferentes domínios (tipo ou tema). Um caso de uso específico em que nos concentramos neste artigo é a resolução de entidades mencionadas em trabalhos científicos e artigos de jornal que os discutem. Identificar as mesmas entidades e conceitos correspondentes em artigos científicos e notícias pode ajudar os cientistas a entender como seu trabalho é representado na grande mídia. Propomos uma nova tarefa e um conjunto de dados em inglês para resolução de co-referência entre documentos e domínios cruzados (CD2CR). A tarefa visa identificar links entre entidades em tipos de documentos heterogêneos. Mostramos que nessa configuração de vários domínios e documentos, os modelos CDCR existentes não funcionam bem e fornecemos um modelo de linha de base que supera os modelos atuais de CDCR de última geração em CD2CR. Nosso conjunto de dados, ferramenta de anotação e diretrizes, bem como nosso modelo de co-referência entre documentos e domínios cruzados, são fornecidos como recursos de código aberto de acesso aberto.', 'ja': 'クロスドキュメント共同参照解決策（ CDCR ）は、多くのテキストドキュメントにわたるエンティティとコンセプトへの言及を特定し、リンクするタスクです。 このタスクの現在の最先端モデルは、すべてのドキュメントが同じタイプ（ニュース記事など）であるか、同じテーマに該当すると仮定しています。 しかしながら、異なるドメイン（タイプまたはテーマ）にわたってCDCRを行うことも望ましい。 この論文で私たちが焦点を当てている特定のユースケースは、科学的研究とそれらについて議論する新聞記事全体で言及されているエンティティの解決です。 科学記事とニュースの両方で同じエンティティと対応する概念を特定することは、科学者が自分の仕事が主流のメディアでどのように表現されているかを理解するのに役立ちます。 ドキュメント間のクロスドメイン共同参照解決（ CD 2 CR ）のための新しいタスクと英語データセットを提案します。 このタスクは、異種ドキュメントタイプ間のエンティティ間のリンクを識別することを目的としています。 このクロスドメイン、クロスドキュメント設定では、既存のCDCRモデルは良好なパフォーマンスを発揮せず、CD 2 CRの現在の最先端のCDCRモデルよりも優れたベースラインモデルを提供することを示しています。 当社のデータセット、アノテーションツール、ガイドライン、およびクロスドキュメントクロスドメイン共同参照のためのモデルは、すべてオープンアクセスオープンソースリソースとして提供されています。', 'zh': '跨文档共引解析 (CDCR) 者,识而链接之档实名也。 凡此诸文档,皆同一体(新闻文)同主。 然跨异域(或主题)行 CDCR 亦可取也。 注文者特定用例科学事论其报纸文之实体分辨率。 科学文与新闻同体相应者助科学家知在主流媒体代表性。 新事英语语数集,跨文档跨域共引解析(CD2CR)。 旨在识跨异构文档之链接。 吾明跨域、跨文档之设也,今CDCR之不善,共一基线之形,优于CD2CR之先进CDCR。 臣等数集、注具与指南及跨文档跨域同引者,皆开取开源资。', 'ru': 'Кросс-документарное соссылочное разрешение (КДПЗ) - это задача выявления и увязки упоминаний с объектами и концепциями во многих текстовых документах. Современные модели для этой задачи предполагают, что все документы имеют один и тот же тип (например, новостные статьи) или относятся к одной и той же теме. Тем не менее, также желательно выполнять CDCR в различных доменах (тип или тема). Особым примером использования, на котором мы сосредоточены в этой статье, является разрешение сущностей, упомянутых в научных работах и газетных статьях, которые их обсуждают. Выявление одних и тех же субъектов и соответствующих концепций как в научных статьях, так и в новостях может помочь ученым понять, как их работа представлена в основных средствах массовой информации. Мы предлагаем новую задачу и набор данных на английском языке для кросс-доменного кореферентного разрешения (CD2CR). Задача направлена на выявление связей между объектами по разнородным типам документов. Мы показываем, что в этой междоменной, кросс-документарной настройке существующие модели CDCR не работают хорошо, и мы предоставляем базовую модель, которая превосходит современные модели CDCR на CD2CR. Наш набор данных, инструмент аннотации и руководящие принципы, а также наша модель кросс-доменной ссылки на документы предоставляются в виде открытых ресурсов с открытым исходным кодом.', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-दस्तावेज़ सह-संदर्भ संकल्प (CDCR) कई पाठ दस्तावेज़ों में संस्थाओं और अवधारणाओं के लिए उल्लेखों की पहचान करने और जोड़ने का कार्य है। इस कार्य के लिए वर्तमान अत्याधुनिक मॉडल मानते हैं कि सभी दस्तावेज़ एक ही प्रकार के हैं (उदाहरण के लिए समाचार लेख) या एक ही विषय के तहत आते हैं। हालांकि, विभिन्न डोमेन (प्रकार या विषय) में CDCR करना भी वांछनीय है। एक विशेष उपयोग का मामला जिस पर हम इस पेपर में ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं, वह वैज्ञानिक कार्य और समाचार पत्र लेखों में उल्लिखित संस्थाओं का संकल्प है जो उन पर चर्चा करते हैं। वैज्ञानिक लेखों और समाचारों दोनों में एक ही संस्थाओं और संबंधित अवधारणाओं की पहचान करने से वैज्ञानिकों को यह समझने में मदद मिल सकती है कि मुख्यधारा के मीडिया में उनके काम का प्रतिनिधित्व कैसे किया जाता है। हम क्रॉस-डॉक्यूमेंट क्रॉस-डोमेन सह-संदर्भ रिज़ॉल्यूशन (CD2CR) के लिए एक नया कार्य और अंग्रेजी भाषा डेटासेट प्रस्तावित करते हैं। कार्य का उद्देश्य विषम दस्तावेज़ प्रकारों में निकायों के बीच लिंक की पहचान करना है. हम दिखाते हैं कि इस क्रॉस-डोमेन, क्रॉस-डॉक्यूमेंट सेटिंग में, मौजूदा सीडीसीआर मॉडल अच्छा प्रदर्शन नहीं करते हैं और हम एक बेसलाइन मॉडल प्रदान करते हैं जो सीडी 2 सीआर पर वर्तमान अत्याधुनिक सीडीसीआर मॉडल को मात देता है। हमारे डेटा सेट, एनोटेशन टूल और दिशानिर्देशों के साथ-साथ क्रॉस-डॉक्यूमेंट क्रॉस-डोमेन सह-संदर्भ के लिए हमारे मॉडल को सभी ओपन एक्सेस ओपन सोर्स संसाधनों के रूप में आपूर्ति की जाती है।', 'ga': 'Is éard atá i gceist le réiteach tras-doiciméadaithe comhthagartha (CDCR) tagairtí a aithint agus a nascadh le haonáin agus le coincheapa trasna go leor doiciméad téacs. Glacann samhlacha úrscothacha don tasc seo leis go bhfuil gach doiciméad den chineál céanna (m.sh. ailt nuachta) nó go dtagann siad faoin téama céanna. Mar sin féin, tá sé inmhianaithe freisin CDCR a dhéanamh thar réimsí éagsúla (cineál nó téama). Cás úsáide ar leith ar a ndírímid sa pháipéar seo is ea réiteach na n-eintiteas a luaitear trasna na hoibre eolaíochta agus na hailt nuachtáin a phléann iad. Is féidir leis na heintitis chéanna agus na coincheapa comhfhreagracha a shainaithint in ailt eolaíocha agus nuachta araon cabhrú le heolaithe tuiscint a fháil ar an gcaoi a léirítear a gcuid oibre sna meáin phríomhshrutha. Molaimid tasc nua agus tacar sonraí Béarla le haghaidh réiteach tras-tagartha tras-fearainn (CD2CR). Tá sé mar aidhm ag an tasc naisc a aithint idir eintitis trasna cineálacha doiciméad ilchineálach. Léirímid sa socrú tras-fearainn, tras-doiciméad seo, nach n-éiríonn go maith le samhlacha CDCR atá ann cheana féin agus soláthraímid múnla bonnlíne a sháraíonn na samhlacha CDCR nua-aimseartha ar CD2CR. Soláthraítear ár dtacar sonraí, ár n-uirlis nótaí agus ár dtreoirlínte chomh maith lenár múnla le haghaidh comhthagairt tras-fearainn trasdoiciméid mar acmhainní foinse oscailte rochtana oscailte.', 'el': 'Η επίλυση διασταυρούμενων εγγράφων συναναφοράς (CDCR) είναι το καθήκον του εντοπισμού και της σύνδεσης αναφορών με οντότητες και έννοιες σε πολλά έγγραφα κειμένου. Τα τρέχοντα μοντέλα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας για την εργασία αυτή υποθέτουν ότι όλα τα έγγραφα είναι του ίδιου τύπου (π.χ. άρθρα ειδήσεων) ή εμπίπτουν στο ίδιο θέμα. Ωστόσο, είναι επίσης επιθυμητό να εκτελέσετε σε διαφορετικούς τομείς (τύπος ή θέμα). Μια ιδιαίτερη περίπτωση χρήσης στην οποία εστιάζουμε στην παρούσα εργασία είναι η επίλυση οντοτήτων που αναφέρονται σε επιστημονικές εργασίες και άρθρα εφημερίδων που τις συζητούν. Ο εντοπισμός των ίδιων οντοτήτων και των αντίστοιχων εννοιών τόσο σε επιστημονικά άρθρα όσο και σε ειδήσεις μπορεί να βοηθήσει τους επιστήμονες να κατανοήσουν πώς το έργο τους εκπροσωπείται στα κυρίαρχα μέσα ενημέρωσης. Προτείνουμε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων εργασίας και αγγλικής γλώσσας για την επίλυση συναπόφασης μεταξύ εγγράφων (CD2CR). Το έργο στοχεύει στον εντοπισμό δεσμών μεταξύ οντοτήτων μεταξύ ετερογενών τύπων εγγράφων. Δείχνουμε ότι σε αυτή τη ρύθμιση μεταξύ τομέων, μεταξύ εγγράφων, τα υπάρχοντα μοντέλα δεν αποδίδουν καλά και παρέχουμε ένα μοντέλο βάσης που ξεπερνά τα τρέχοντα μοντέλα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας στο CD2CR. Το σύνολο δεδομένων μας, το εργαλείο σχολιασμού και οι κατευθυντήριες γραμμές, καθώς και το μοντέλο μας για τη συνεργασία μεταξύ εγγράφων μεταξύ τομέων παρέχονται όλα ως πόροι ανοικτής πρόσβασης.', 'hu': 'A keresztdokumentumok közös hivatkozási felbontása (CDCR) a hivatkozások azonosítása és összekapcsolása számos szöveges dokumentumban. A feladat jelenlegi korszerű modelljei azt feltételezik, hogy minden dokumentum azonos típusú (például hírek) vagy ugyanazon témába tartozik. Azonban kívánatos CDCR-t végrehajtani különböző tartományokon (típus vagy téma). Egy különös használati esetre koncentrálunk ebben a tanulmányban a tudományos munkákban és újságcikkekben említett entitások megoldása. Ugyanazon entitások és a megfelelő fogalmak azonosítása mind a tudományos cikkekben, mind a hírekben segíthet a tudósoknak megérteni, hogyan képviselik munkájukat a mainstream médiában. Javasolunk egy új feladatot és angol nyelvű adatkészletet a cross-domain co-reference felbontáshoz (CD2CR). A feladat célja, hogy azonosítsa az entitások közötti kapcsolatokat heterogén dokumentumtípusok között. Megmutatjuk, hogy ebben a tartományok közötti, dokumentumok közötti beállításban a meglévő CDCR modellek nem teljesítenek jól, és olyan alapvető modellt adunk, amely felülmúlja a jelenlegi CDCR modelleket CD2CR modelleken. Adatkészletünk, jegyzetelő eszközünk és iránymutatásaink, valamint a keresztdokumentumok közötti együttes hivatkozási modellünk nyílt hozzáférésű nyílt forráskódú erőforrásként szolgál.', 'it': "La risoluzione dei co-riferimenti incrociati (CDCR) è il compito di identificare e collegare le menzioni a entità e concetti in molti documenti di testo. I modelli attuali allo stato dell'arte per questa attività presuppongono che tutti i documenti siano dello stesso tipo (ad esempio articoli di notizie) o rientrino nello stesso tema. Tuttavia, è anche auspicabile eseguire CDCR in diversi domini (tipo o tema). Un caso d'uso particolare su cui ci concentriamo in questo articolo è la risoluzione di entità menzionate attraverso lavori scientifici e articoli di giornale che ne parlano. Identificare le stesse entità e concetti corrispondenti in articoli scientifici e notizie può aiutare gli scienziati a capire come il loro lavoro è rappresentato nei media mainstream. Proponiamo un nuovo task e un set di dati in lingua inglese per la risoluzione cross-document cross-domain co-reference resolution (CD2CR). L'attività mira a identificare i collegamenti tra entità attraverso tipi di documenti eterogenei. Mostriamo che in questa impostazione cross-domain, cross-document, i modelli CDCR esistenti non funzionano bene e forniamo un modello di base che supera i modelli CDCR attuali allo stato dell'arte su CD2CR. Il nostro set di dati, lo strumento di annotazione e le linee guida, nonché il nostro modello per il co-riferimento cross-domain tra documenti, sono tutti forniti come risorse open source ad accesso aperto.", 'kk': 'Құжаттардың бірінші сілтеме айырмашылығы (CDCR) деген мәтін құжаттардың бірнеше мәтін құжаттарына айырмашылығын анықтау мен сілтемелеу тапсырмасы. Бұл тапсырманың күй- жай моделдері барлық құжаттар бір түрінде (мысалы, жаңалық мақалалар) немесе бір нақыштың астында тұрады деп ойлайды. Бірақ, басқа домендер (түрі не нақыш) арасында CDCR жұмыс істеу керек. Біз осы қағазға назар аударып тұрғанымыз - ғылыми жұмыс мен қағаз мақалаларының айырмашылығы. Екі ғылым мақалалар мен жаңалықтардың бір мақалаларын анықтау және сәйкес концепцияларын ғылымдарға олардың жұмысының негізгі медиақтарда қалай тұратынын түсінуге көмектес Біз жаңа тапсырма мен ағылшын тілінің деректер жинағын құжатты көпшілікті доменнің көпшілікті айырмашылығы (CD2CR) үшін ұсынамыз. Тапсырма гетероген құжат түрлері арасындағы бірліктерді анықтау мақсаты. Біз бұл құжаттарды көбейткен құжаттар параметрлерінде бар CDCR үлгілері жақсы істемейді және CD2CR үлгілерінде назардағы CDCR үлгілерінің негізгі жол үлгісін таңдаймыз. Біздің деректер жиынымыз, жаңарту құралы мен бағыттау жолдарымыз және біздің құжатты көпшілік доменге көпшілік сілтемелер үшін үлгілеріміз ашық көзі ресурста', 'lt': 'Cross-document co-reference resolution (CDCR) is the task of identifying and linking mentions to entities and concepts across many text documents.  Dabartiniai šios užduoties moderniausi modeliai daro prielaidą, kad visi dokumentai yra vienodo pobūdžio (pvz., naujienų straipsniai) arba patenka į tą pačią temą. Tačiau taip pat pageidautina atlikti CDCR įvairiose srityse (tipas ar tema). Ypatingas naudojimo atvejis, į kurį šiame dokumente daugiausia dėmesio skiriame, yra subjektų, nurodytų moksliniuose darbuose ir laikraščių straipsniuose, kurie juos aptaria, rezoliucija. Tokių pačių subjektų ir atitinkamų sąvokų nustatymas tiek moksliniuose straipsniuose, tiek naujienose gali padėti mokslininkams suprasti, kaip jų darbas atstovaujamas pagrindinėje žiniasklaidoje. Siūlome naują užduotį ir anglų kalbos duomenų rinkinį, skirtą tarpdokumentinei tarpsritinei bendros nuorodos rezoliucijai (CD2CR). Šios užduoties tikslas – nustatyti subjektų tarpusavio ryšius įvairių tipų dokumentuose. Mes parodome, kad šioje įvairių sričių, įvairių dokumentų aplinkoje esami CDCR modeliai neveikia gerai ir mes pateikiame bazinį model į, kuris viršija dabartinius pažangiausius CDCR modelius CD2CR. Mūsų duomenų rinkinys, anotacijos priemonė ir gairės, taip pat mūsų tarpdokumentinės tarpsritinės nuorodos modelis pateikiami kaip atviros prieigos atvirojo šaltinio ištekliai.', 'mk': 'Кросреференциска резолуција (CDCR) е задача за идентификување и поврзување на спомените со ентитетите и концептите низ многу текстови документи. Сегашните најнови модели за оваа задача претпоставуваат дека сите документи се од ист тип (np. вести) или се под иста тема. Сепак, исто така е посакувано да се изврши CDCR низ различни домени (тип или тема). Особен случај на употреба на кој се фокусираме во овој весник е резолуцијата на ентитетите споменати низ научната работа и весниците кои ги дискутираат. Идентификувањето на истите ентитети и соодветните концепти во научните статии и вестите може да им помогне на научниците да разберат како нивната работа е претставена во главните медиуми. Предложуваме нова задача и набор на податоци на англиски јазик за крстодокументална референциска резолуција (CD2CR). Оваа задача има за цел идентификување на врските меѓу ентитетите меѓу хетерогенските типови на документи. Покажуваме дека во ова крсто-домен, крсто-документно поставување, постојните модели на CDCR не функционираат добро и обезбедуваме основен модел кој ги надминува актуелните модели на CDCR на CD2CR. Нашиот набор на податоци, алатка за анотација и насоки, како и нашиот модел за крсто-документна крсто-домен кореференција се обезбедени како отворен пристап на отворени извори.', 'ka': 'მრავალე დოკუმენტის კოდირენციური რეზიციო (CDCR) არის მრავალე ტექსტის დოკუმენტების განსაზღვრება და დაკავშირება. ამ დავალებისთვის მიმდინარე სურათის მოდელები წარმოიდგინენ, რომ ყველა დოკუმენტები იგივე ტიპის (მაგალითად, ახალგაზომის არქეები) ან იგივე ტემების ქვემოთ. მაგრამ უნდა CDCR გავაკეთოთ განსხვავებული დიომენში (ტიპი ან ტემა). განსაკუთრებული გამოყენების შემთხვევაში ჩვენ კონუქტირებით ამ დონეში არის მეცნიერო სამუშაო და დონეური წიგნის განსაკუთრება, რომელიც ისინი განსაკუთრე იგივე განსაზღვრება და შესაბამისი კონფექტები მეცნიერო არსებში და ნუზების შესაბამისი მეცნიერებელი შეუძლია გავიგოთ როგორ სამუშაო მუშაო მედიაში ი ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ ახალი დავალება და ინგლისური ენის მონაცემების შესახებ კრასკუმენტის კოდემენტის კოდემენტის კოდემენტის კოდემენტის განსაზღვრება დავალების მიხედვით, რომ ელექტიების შორის ჰეტეროგენური დოკუმენტის ტიპების განსაზღვრება. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ამ კრისი დოკუმენტის კონფიგურაციაში, მსგავსი CDCR მოდელები არ გავაკეთებენ კარგი და ჩვენ მივიღებთ ფესური მოდელი, რომელიც CD2CR-ზე მიმდინარე CDCR მოდელების ჩვენი მონაცემები, ანოტაციის ხელსაწყოთა და მონაცემები, და ჩვენი მოდელი კრასკუმენტის კოდისმენტის კოდისმენტის კოდისმენტის კოდისმენტის კოდისმენტის', 'ms': 'Resolusi rujukan salib-dokumen (CDCR) adalah tugas untuk mengenalpasti dan menghubungkan sebutan kepada entiti dan konsep melalui banyak dokumen teks. Model state-of-the-art semasa untuk tugas ini menganggap semua dokumen adalah jenis yang sama (cth. artikel berita) atau jatuh di bawah tema yang sama. Namun, ia juga diinginkan untuk melakukan CDCR melalui domain yang berbeza (jenis atau tema). Kasus penggunaan tertentu yang kita fokus pada dalam kertas ini adalah resolusi entiti yang disebut di seluruh kerja saintifik dan artikel kertas yang membincangkannya. Mengenalpasti entiti yang sama dan konsep yang sepadan dalam artikel saintifik dan berita boleh membantu saintis memahami bagaimana kerja mereka diwakili dalam media utama. Kami cadangkan tugas baru dan set data bahasa Inggeris untuk resolusi rujukan saling-domain dokumen (CD2CR). Tugas bertujuan untuk mengenalpasti pautan antara entiti melalui jenis dokumen yang heterogen. Kami menunjukkan bahawa dalam tetapan cross-domain, cross-document ini, model CDCR yang wujud tidak berjaya dan kami menyediakan model asas yang melampaui model CDCR yang kini state-of-the-art pada CD2CR. Set data, alat anotasi dan panduan kami serta model kami untuk rujukan saling-domain dokumen semua diberikan sebagai sumber sumber terbuka akses terbuka.', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്- രേഖയുടെ കോട്രെയെന്\u200dഷന്\u200d റിസ്റ്റല്\u200d (സിഡിസിഎം) പല ടെക്സ്റ്റ് രേഖകള്\u200dക്കും മുകളിലുമുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വേണ Current state-of-the-art models for this task assume that all documents are of the same type (e.g. news articles) or fall under the same theme.  എന്നാലും വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡോമെന്\u200dമെനുകളില്\u200d CDCR പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനും ആഗ്രഹം( തരം അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d പ്രമേയ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ശാസ്ത്ര ജോലിക്കും പത്രത്തിലുമുള്ള വസ്തുക്കളുടെ വിശദീകരണത്തിന്റെയും പ്രഖ്യാപനത്തിന്റെയും  ശാസ്ത്ര രേഖകളിലും വാര്\u200dത്തകങ്ങളിലും ഒരേ വസ്തുക്കളെ തിരിച്ചറിയാനും ശാസ്ത്രജ്ഞന്മാര്\u200dക്കും വിജ്ഞാനികള്\u200dക്ക് എങ്ങനെയാണ് അവരുട ക്രിസ്റ്റര്\u200d ഡോമെയിന്\u200d കോഡ്മെയിന്\u200d കോര്\u200dവെയരെന്\u200dസ് റിസിലേഷന്\u200d (സിഡി2CR) വേണ്ടി പുതിയ ജോലിയും ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്  ഈ ജോലിയുടെ ലക്ഷ്യം ഹെറോജെന്റ് രേഖകളിലുള്ള വസ്തുക്കളുടെ ഇടയിലുള്ള ബന്ധം തിരിച്ചറിയാനാണ്. നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു, ഈ ക്രിസ്റ്റോമെയിനില്\u200d, ക്രിസ്റ്റ് രേഖകളുടെ സജ്ജീകരണത്തില്\u200d, നിലവിലുള്ള സിഡിസിഎ മോഡലുകള്\u200d നല്ല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പ നമ്മുടെ ഡേറ്റാ സജ്ജീകരിക്കുന്നത്, അഭിപ്രായശ്ചിത്രത്തിന്റെ ഉപകരണങ്ങളും വഴികാട്ടികളും ക്രിസ്റ്റ് ഡോമെയിന്\u200d കോഡോമെനെന', 'pl': 'Zadaniem identyfikacji i łączenia wzmianek do podmiotów i koncepcji w wielu dokumentach tekstowych jest identyfikacja i łączenie wzmianek do podmiotów i koncepcji. Aktualne najnowocześniejsze modele tego zadania zakładają, że wszystkie dokumenty są tego samego typu (np. artykuły wiadomościowe) lub podlegają tym samym tematom. Jednak pożądane jest również wykonywanie CDCR w różnych domenach (typ lub temat). Szczególnym przypadkiem użycia, na którym skupiamy się w niniejszym artykule, jest uchwała podmiotów wymienionych w pracach naukowych i artykułach gazetowych omawiających je. Identyfikacja tych samych podmiotów i odpowiadających im koncepcji w artykułach naukowych i wiadomościach może pomóc naukowcom zrozumieć, w jaki sposób ich praca jest reprezentowana w głównym nurcie mediów. Proponujemy nowy zestaw danych zadań i języka angielskiego dla rozwiązywania współreferencyjnego między dokumentami (CD2CR). Celem zadania jest identyfikacja powiązań między podmiotami w różnych heterogenicznych typach dokumentów. Pokazujemy, że w tym ustawieniu między domenami, między dokumentami istniejące modele CDCR nie działają dobrze i dostarczamy model bazowy, który przewyższa aktualne najnowocześniejsze modele CDCR na CD2CR. Nasz zestaw danych, narzędzie do adnotacji i wytyczne, jak również nasz model współreferencji między dokumentami są dostarczane jako zasoby open source.', 'mt': "Ir-riżoluzzjoni ta’ koreferenza bejn id-dokumenti (CDCR) hija l-kompitu li tidentifika u tgħaqqad is-semmijiet ma’ entitajiet u kunċetti f’ħafna dokumenti tat-test. Current state-of-the-art models for this task assume that all documents are of the same type (e.g. news articles) or fall under the same theme.  Madankollu, huwa mixtieq ukoll li jsir CDCR f’oqsma differenti (tip jew tema). Każ partikolari ta’ użu li qed niffokaw fuq f’dan id-dokument huwa r-riżoluzzjoni ta’ entitajiet imsemmija fix-xogħol xjentifiku u l-artikoli tal-gazzetti li jiddiskutuhom. L-identifikazzjoni tal-istess entitajiet u l-kunċetti korrispondenti kemm fl-artikoli xjentifiċi kif ukoll fl-aħbarijiet jistgħu jgħinu lix-xjenzati jifhmu kif ix-xogħol tagħhom huwa rappreżentat fil-midja ewlenija. Aħna nipproponu kompitu ġdid u sett ta' dejta tal-lingwa Ingliża għal riżoluzzjoni ta' ko-referenza trans-dokumenti (CD2CR). Il-kompitu għandu l-għan li jidentifika r-rabtiet bejn l-entitajiet bejn tipi ta’ dokumenti eteroġeni. Aħna nuru li f’dan is-sett ta’ cross-domain, cross-document, il-mudelli eżistenti tas-CDCR ma jwettqux tajjeb u nagħtu mudell ta’ linja bażi li jwettaq mudelli tas-CDCR l-aktar avvanzati attwali fuq is-CD2CR. Is-sett tad-dejta tagħna, l-għodda u l-linji gwida għall-annotazzjoni kif ukoll il-mudell tagħna għall-ko-referenza trans-dokumenti fid-dominji kollha huma pprovduti bħala riżorsi open source ta’ aċċess miftuħ.", 'mn': 'Дөрвөн баримт нийлүүлэлтийн шийдвэрлэлт (CDCR) бол олон текст баримт бичгийг тодорхойлох, холбох үйл ажиллагаа юм. Энэ ажлын орчин үеийн урлагийн загвар бүх баримтууд ижил төрлийн (жишээ нь мэдээллийн баримтууд) эсвэл ижил загварын доор унасан гэж ойлгож байна. Гэхдээ CDCR-г өөр хэсэгт (төрлийн эсвэл сэтгэл хөдлөл) хийх нь мөн хүсэлтэй. Энэ цаасан дээр бидний анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлэх тодорхой хэрэглээний тухай нь шинжлэх ухааны ажлын, сонин баримтуудын шийдвэрлэл юм. Шинжлэх ухааны баримтууд болон мэдээллийн тухай ижил бүтээлүүдийг тодорхойлох нь эрдэмтэд хэрхэн ажилладаг талаар ойлгоход тусалдаг. Бид шинэ ажил болон Англи хэл өгөгдлийн сангуудыг дэлхийн хэлбэртэй холбоотой холбоотой шийдэл (CD2CR) гэж санал болгож байна. Үүний зорилго нь бичлэгүүдийн хоорондын холбоотой холбоотой байдаг. Бид эдгээр олон дотор бичил баримтуудын хэмжээнд оршиж байгаа CDCR загварууд сайн ажиллахгүй, CD2CR дээрх орчин үеийн CDCR загваруудыг ашиглаж чадах суурь шугам загварын загварыг гаргаж байна. Бидний мэдээллийн багц, анзаарлын хэрэгсэл, удирдлага, мөн гишүүн баримт бичсэн хамтран холбоотой загвар бүгд нээлттэй эх эх үүсвэрийн нээлттэй боловсруулагддаг.', 'no': 'Kryssdokumentoppløysing (CDCR) er oppgåva for å identifisera og kopla namn til einingar og konseptar over mange tekstdokument. Gjeldande modeller for kunsten for denne oppgåva antar at all e dokumenta er av same type (f.eks. nye artiklar) eller fallar under same tema. Men det er også ønskja å utføra CDCR over ulike domene (type eller tema). Eit spesielt bruk tilfelle vi fokuserer på denne papiret er oppløysinga av einingar som er oppgjeven over vitenskapelige arbeid og arkivartiklar som diskuterer dei. Å identifisere dei samme einingane og tilsvarande konseptar i både vitenskapelige artiklar og nyhetar kan hjelpa til vitenskapelige å forstå korleis arbeidet sine er representert i hovudmedia. Vi foreslår eit nytt oppgåve og engelsk språk- dataset for cross- document cross- domain co- reference resolution (CD2CR). Oppgåva måtar å identifisera lenkjer mellom einingar over ulike dokumenttypar. Vi viser at i denne krysdomeneinnstillinga, kryssdokumentinnstillinga, eksisterande CDCR-modeller utfører ikkje godt, og vi gir ein baseline modell som utfører gjeldande CDCR-modeller på CD2CR. Datatsettet, notasjonsverktøyet og hjelpelinjer våre, og modellen våre for cross-document cross-domain-reference er alle tilgjengelege som opna tilgang-kjelderessursar.', 'sr': 'Prekrsno dokumentovana rezolucija (CDCR) je zadatak identifikacije i povezivanja spomena sa entitetima i konceptima u mnogim tekstskim dokumentima. Trenutni modeli umetnosti za ovaj zadatak pretpostavljaju da su svi dokumenti isti (npr. novinski članovi) ili pod istim temama. Međutim, takođe je željno izvršiti CDCR preko različitih domena (tipa ili tema). Posebni slučaj upotrebe na koji se fokusiramo u ovom novinama je rezolucija entitata spomenuta preko naučnog rada i novinskih članaka koji ih razgovaraju. Identifikovanje iste entitete i odgovarajućih koncepta u znanstvenim člancima i vestima mogu pomoći naučnicima da shvate kako njihov rad predstavlja u glavnim medijima. Predlažemo novi zadatak i podaci engleskog jezika za korisnu rezoluciju preko domena (CD2CR). Taj zadatak je cilj da identifikuje veze između entitata preko heterogeneznih tipa dokumenta. Pokazujemo da u ovom prekršenom domenu postojećih model a CDCR-a ne izvršavaju dobro i pružamo osnovni model koji iznosi trenutne modele CDCR-a na CD2CR-u. Naša kompleta podataka, alata za annotaciju i uputstva, kao i naš model za zajedničku referenciju preko dokumenata, sve su dostavljene kao otvorene resurse izvora otvorenog pristupa.', 'ro': 'Rezoluția de corespondență încrucișată (CDCR) este sarcina de a identifica și de a lega mențiunile la entități și concepte din multe documente text. Modelele actuale de ultimă generație pentru această sarcină presupun că toate documentele sunt de același tip (de exemplu articole de știri) sau se încadrează sub aceeași temă. Cu toate acestea, este de dorit, de asemenea, să efectuați CDCR pe diferite domenii (tip sau temă). Un caz de utilizare particular pe care ne concentrăm în această lucrare este rezoluția entităților menționate în cadrul lucrărilor științifice și articolelor de ziar care le discută. Identificarea acelorași entități și concepte corespunzătoare atât în articole științifice, cât și în știri, poate ajuta oamenii de știință să înțeleagă modul în care munca lor este reprezentată în mass-media mainstream. Propunem o nouă sarcină și un set de date în limba engleză pentru rezoluția cross-document cross-domeniu de co-referință (CD2CR). Activitatea urmărește identificarea legăturilor dintre entități din tipuri de documente eterogene. Arătăm că în această setare cross-domeniu, cross-document, modelele CDCR existente nu funcționează bine și oferim un model de bază care depășește modelele CDCR actuale de ultimă generație pe CD2CR. Setul nostru de date, instrumentul de adnotare și orientările, precum și modelul nostru pentru co-referință cross-domain cross-document sunt toate furnizate ca resurse open source cu acces deschis.', 'so': 'Go’aanka iskala-reference-dhigista iskutallaabta iskuulka ah (CDCR) waa shaqada ku aqoonsashada iyo ku xiriira macluumaadyada iyo fikirrada warqado qoraal ah oo dhan. Tusaale ahaan farshaxankaas oo ku qoran waxay u malaynayaan in dukumentiyada oo dhammu ay isku mid yihiin (tusaale ahaan warqadaha warqadaha warqadaha) ama ay ku hoos dhacaan isla theme. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa suurtogal ah in CDCR lagu sameeyo meelaha kala duwan (nooca ama tijaab). A particular use case we focus on in this paper is the resolution of entities mentioned across scientific work and newspaper articles that discuss them.  Aqoonsashada isku mid ah iyo fikrada isku mid ah oo ku habboon qoraalada sayniska iyo warbixinta labadoodaba waxay caawin karaan cilmiyiinta ay garan karaan sida shaqadoodu ugu representayo macluumaadka sare. Shaqada cusub iyo macluumaadka afka ingiriisiga waxaynu u soo jeedaynaa qoraal-dokumenta kala duduwan oo kala duduwan (CD2CR). Shaqada waxaa loola jeedaa in uu aqoonsado xiriir u dhexeeya waxyaabaha ku jira noocyada dukumentiyada kala duduwan. Waxaynu muujinaynaa in sameynta qoraalka kala duwan ee CDCR ay jiraan aysan si wanaagsan u sameyn, waxaana sameynaa model hoose oo ka muuqata qoraalka CD2CR oo ku qoran qoraalka saxda ee farshaxanka ah CDCR. Dhammaan waxaa loo isticmaalaa asalka macluumaadkayaga, qalabka wargelinta iyo hagitaanada, sidoo kale qaababka noogu saabsan sameynta dukumentiyada kala duduwan ee gudaha kala duwan.', 'sv': 'Cross-document co-reference resolution (CDCR) är uppgiften att identifiera och länka omnämnanden till entiteter och begrepp i många textdokument. Aktuella toppmoderna modeller för denna uppgift förutsätter att alla dokument är av samma typ (t.ex. nyhetsartiklar) eller faller under samma tema. Det är dock också önskvärt att utföra CDCR över olika domäner (typ eller tema). Ett särskilt användningsfall vi fokuserar på i denna uppsats är resolutionen av enheter som nämns över vetenskapligt arbete och tidningsartiklar som diskuterar dem. Att identifiera samma entiteter och motsvarande begrepp i både vetenskapliga artiklar och nyheter kan hjälpa forskare att förstå hur deras arbete representeras i mainstream media. Vi föreslår en ny uppgift och engelskspråkig datauppsättning för cross-document cross-domain co-reference resolution (CD2CR). Uppgiften syftar till att identifiera länkar mellan entiteter mellan heterogena dokumenttyper. Vi visar att befintliga CDCR-modeller inte presterar bra i den här gränsöverskridande inställningen och vi tillhandahåller en basmodell som överträffar nuvarande state-of-the-art CDCR-modeller på CD2CR. Våra datauppsättningar, anteckningsverktyg och riktlinjer samt vår modell för samreferens över flera dokument tillhandahålls som open source-resurser.', 'si': 'විශාල ලිපිනය සම්බන්ධ විශේෂණය (CDCR) තමයි ලිපින්ත ලිපින්ත ලිපින්ත වලට පරිශීලනය සහ සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම් මේ වැඩේ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය- of- the- art නිර්මාණය හිතන්නේ හැම ලිපිණියක්ම එකම වර්ගයෙන් ඉන්න (උදාහරණයේ වාර්තාව ප නමුත්, වෙනස් ඩෝමේන් වලට CDCR ක්\u200dරියාත්මක කරන්න අවශ්\u200dයයි (වර්ගය හා තේමාවක්). විශේෂ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් අපි මේ පත්තරේ බලන්නේ විද්\u200dයාත්මක ව්\u200dයාපෘතික වැඩක් සහ පත්තර පත්තර පත්තර වලින් කිය විද්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිපත්ති සහ විද්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිපත්තිය සඳහා සම්බන්ධ විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාඥයෝ වලට උදව් කරන්න පුළ අපි අළුත් වැඩක් සහ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි භාෂාව දත්ත සැකසුම් කරනවා ක්\u200dරිස්ට් ඩොමේන් එක්ක ප්\u200dරවේශ විශේෂණය ( වැඩේ අල්ලගන්නවා විශේෂ විශේෂ ලිපින් වර්ගයක් අතර සම්බන්ධතාවක් හඳුන්න. අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ ක්\u200dරීස් ඩෝමේන් වල, ක්\u200dරීස් ඩොකේන්ට් සැකසුම්, තියෙන්න තියෙන CDCR මොඩේල් හොඳ වැඩක් නැහැ ඒ වගේම අපි CD2CR වල ඉදිරිය CD අපේ තොරතුරු සැකසුම, කිරීම් උපකරණය සහ මාර්ගය ප්\u200dරවේශය සහ අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක ක්\u200dරීස් ඩොමේන් එක්ක ප්\u200dරවේශය සම්බන්ධය ස', 'ta': 'கிருஸ்- ஆவணம் கூட்டு மேற்கோள் தெளிவுத்திறன் (CDCR) பல உரை ஆவணங்களில் உள்ள பொருளுக்கும் மற்றும் கருத்துக்களுக்கும் கூற இந்த செயலுக்கான தற்போதைய நிலை- கலை மாதிரிகள் அனைத்து ஆவணங்களும் ஒரே வகையாக இருக்கின்றன என்று கருதுகிறார்கள் அல்லது அதே பொருளின் க However, இதுவும் வேறு களங்களில் CDCR செயல்படுத்த வேண்டும் (type or theme). ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட பயன்படுத்தல் விஷயம் நாம் இந்த தாளில் கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம் என்பது அறிவியல் வேலை மற்றும் தெரியும் பொர அறிவியல் கட்டுரைகள் மற்றும் செய்திகளும் இருவரும் ஒரே பொருள்களை அடையாளம் மற்றும் ஒத்திசையான கருத்துக்களை அறிவியலாளர்கள் புரிந்த நாம் ஒரு புதிய செயல் மற்றும் ஆங்கிலத்தின் மொழி தகவல் அமைப்பை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் குறிப்பு ஆவணம் கடவுச்சொல்லும இந்த செயல் பொருள்களுக்கு இடையே உள்ள இணைப்புகளை வெவ்வேறு அடர்த்திய ஆவண வகைகளுக்கு மேல் கண்டறியும். நாம் இந்த குறுக்கும் களஞ்சியத்தில், குறுக்கும் ஆவண அமைப்பில், இருக்கும் CDCR மாதிரிகள் நன்றாக செயல்படுத்த முடியாது மற்றும் நாம் ஒரு அடிப்படை மாதி எங்கள் தகவல் அமைப்பு, அறிவிப்பு கருவி மற்றும் நேர்வழிகாட்டிகள் மற்றும் எங்கள் மாதிரி முறைமையில் உள்ள குறிப்பு குறிப்பிட்ட', 'ur': 'Cross-document co-reference resolution اس کام کے لئے موجود state-of-the-art موڈل سمجھتے ہیں کہ تمام سند ایک ہی طرح ہیں (جیسے اخبار لکھائی) یا ایک ہی طرح کے نیچے گرتے ہیں۔ However, it is also desirable to perform CDCR across different domains (type or theme). ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک مخصوص استعمال کیسی پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں یہ سائنس کاروبار اور کاغذ مجموعہ کے ذریعہ سے بیان کیا گیا ہے۔ اور سائنس لکھوں اور خبروں میں ایک ہی چیزوں کی شناسایی کرتی ہے اور ان کے کام کیسے عملی میڈیا میں نمایش کی جاتی ہے۔ ہم ایک نئی دنیا اور انگلیسی زبان ڈیٹ سٹ کی پیشنهاد کرس-ڈومین کرس-ڈومین کے ساتھ کرس-رانس روزی (CD2CR) کے لئے۔ اس کام کا ارادہ یہ ہے کہ ایک ٹیٹی کے درمیان مختلف دفتر کے ٹیپ کے اندر لینک شناسایی کریں. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ کرس-ڈومین، کرس-ڈوکینٹ سٹینٹ میں، موجود CDCR موڈل اچھی طرح عمل نہیں کرتے اور ہم ایک بنیس لین موڈل دیتے ہیں جو CD2CR کے ذریعہ موجود CDCR موڈل کو اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ ہمارے ڈیٹ سٹ، انٹوریٹ تولیل اور ہدایت لینڈ اور ہماری مدل کرس-ڈومین کروس-ڈومین کے ساتھ سب کھلی دسترسی سورس کے طور پر پورے کئے جاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Name @ info: whatsthis Lekin, boshqa domenalarda CDCR bajarish kerak (turi yoki mavzu). Bu takarda biz foydalanuvchi foydalanuvchi hodisa, ilmiy ish va gazeti maqolalari haqida gapiradigan obʼektlar haqida o'zgartirish. Ilmiy maqolalar va yangi xabarlarda bitta bir tashkilotni aniqlash va o'xshash g'oyalarni aniqlash imkoniyatini asosiy media'da qanday ishni tashkil qilishini aniqlashga yordam beradi. @ info: status Name Biz shu shaxsiy kompyuterda mavjud CDCR modellari yaxshi bajarmaydi va biz CD2CR'ning joriy shaxsiy CDCR modellarini bajarayotgan baseline modelini yaratish mumkin. Bizning maʼlumotlar tarkibi, taʼminlovchi vositasi va qoʻllanmalar va cross-domen koʻpaytirish modelimiz hamma ochiq mavjud manbalar kabi imkoniyatlar.", 'vi': 'Cộng chất phân giải tài liệu chéo (CRC) là nhiệm vụ xác định và kết nối các thực thể và khái niệm qua nhiều tài liệu văn bản. Các mô hình hiện thời cho nhiệm vụ này giả sử mọi tài liệu đều có cùng kiểu (v. d. các bài báo) hay có cùng một sắc thái. Tuy nhiên, khả năng thực hiện CDO nằm trong các lĩnh vực khác nhau (kiểu hay sắc thái). Một trường hợp đặc biệt mà chúng ta tập trung vào trong tờ giấy này là giải quyết các thực thể được nhắc đến trong các công trình khoa học và các bài báo thảo luận về chúng. Việc xác định cùng các thực thể và các khái niệm tương ứng trong cả các bài báo và tin tức khoa học có thể giúp các nhà khoa học hiểu cách mà công việc của họ được đại diện trong truyền thông chính thống. Chúng tôi đề xuất một tập tin mới về ngôn ngữ Anh quốc cho giải pháp tham khảo trên toàn miền (C2CR). Nhiệm vụ này nhằm xác định mối liên kết giữa các thực thể trong các kiểu tài liệu khác nhau. Chúng tôi cho thấy trong thiết lập giao diện, thập tài liệu này, các mô hình CDO hiện thời không hoạt động tốt và chúng tôi cung cấp một mô hình cơ bản vượt trội các mô hình CDO hiện đại trên giá trị CR. Tất cả các dữ liệu, công cụ chú thích và hướng dẫn cũng như mô hình tham chiếu xuyên lục tài liệu được cung cấp như nguồn mở.', 'bg': 'Разрешаването на кръстосани документи (CDCR) е задачата да идентифицира и свързва споменаванията с обекти и концепции в много текстови документи. Съвременните модели за тази задача предполагат, че всички документи са от един и същ тип (например новинарски статии) или попадат в една и съща тема. Желателно е обаче също да се изпълнява CDCR в различни домейни (тип или тема). Конкретен случай на използване, върху който се фокусираме в тази статия, е резолюцията на субектите, споменати в научната работа и статиите от вестници, които ги обсъждат. Идентифицирането на същите субекти и съответните понятия както в научните статии, така и в новините може да помогне на учените да разберат как тяхната работа е представена в основните медии. Предлагаме нова задача и набор от данни на английски език за кръстосана разделителна способност на междудомейните съвместни референции (CD2CR). Задачата има за цел да идентифицира връзките между обекти в хетерогенни типове документи. Показваме, че в тази междудомейнна настройка на междудокументите съществуващите модели не работят добре и предлагаме базов модел, който превъзхожда съвременните модели на CDCR на CD2CR. Нашият набор от данни, инструмент за анотация и насоки, както и нашия модел за междудокументна съвместна препратка между домейни, се предоставят като ресурси с отворен код с отворен достъп.', 'nl': 'Cross-Document Co-Reference Resolution (CDCR) is de taak van het identificeren en koppelen van vermeldingen aan entiteiten en concepten in veel tekstdocumenten. De huidige state-of-the-art modellen voor deze taak gaan ervan uit dat alle documenten van hetzelfde type zijn (bijvoorbeeld nieuwsberichten) of onder hetzelfde thema vallen. Het is echter ook wenselijk om CDCR uit te voeren over verschillende domeinen (type of thema). Een bijzondere use case waar we ons in dit artikel op richten is de resolutie van entiteiten genoemd in wetenschappelijk werk en krantenartikelen die hierover discussiëren. Het identificeren van dezelfde entiteiten en bijbehorende concepten in zowel wetenschappelijke artikelen als nieuws kan wetenschappers helpen begrijpen hoe hun werk wordt vertegenwoordigd in de mainstream media. We stellen een nieuwe taak- en Engelstalige dataset voor cross-document cross-domein co-reference resolutie (CD2CR) voor. De taak is gericht op het identificeren van koppelingen tussen entiteiten tussen heterogene documenttypen. We laten zien dat bestaande CDCR-modellen in deze domeinoverschrijdende instelling niet goed presteren en we bieden een basismodel dat beter presteert dan de huidige state-of-the-art CDCR-modellen op CD2CR. Onze dataset, annotatietool en richtlijnen evenals ons model voor cross-document cross-domein co-reference worden allemaal geleverd als open access open source bronnen.', 'da': 'Cross-document co-reference resolution (CDCR) er opgaven at identificere og linke omtaler til enheder og begreber på tværs af mange tekstdokumenter. Nuværende state-of-the-art modeller for denne opgave antager, at alle dokumenter er af samme type (f.eks. nyhedsartikler) eller falder ind under samme tema. Det er dog også ønskeligt at udføre CDCR på tværs af forskellige domæner (type eller tema). En særlig brugssag, vi fokuserer på i denne artikel, er opløsningen af enheder nævnt på tværs af videnskabeligt arbejde og avisartikler, der diskuterer dem. At identificere de samme enheder og tilsvarende begreber i både videnskabelige artikler og nyheder kan hjælpe forskere med at forstå, hvordan deres arbejde er repræsenteret i mainstream medier. Vi foreslår en ny opgave og engelsk datasæt til cross-document cross-domain co-reference resolution (CD2CR). Opgaven har til formål at identificere forbindelser mellem enheder på tværs af heterogene dokumenttyper. Vi viser, at eksisterende CDCR-modeller i denne tværgående indstilling ikke fungerer godt, og vi leverer en basismodel, der overgår nuværende state-of-the-art CDCR-modeller på CD2CR. Vores datasæt, annotationsværktøj og retningslinjer samt vores model for samreference på tværs af dokumenter leveres alle som open source ressourcer.', 'de': 'Cross-Document Co-Reference Resolution (CDCR) ist die Aufgabe, Erwähnungen mit Entitäten und Konzepten in vielen Textdokumenten zu identifizieren und zu verknüpfen. Aktuelle State-of-the-Art Modelle für diese Aufgabe gehen davon aus, dass alle Dokumente vom gleichen Typ sind (z.B. Nachrichtenartikel) oder unter das gleiche Thema fallen. Es ist jedoch auch wünschenswert, CDCR über verschiedene Domänen (Typ oder Thema) durchzuführen. Ein besonderer Anwendungsfall, auf den wir uns in diesem Beitrag konzentrieren, ist die Auflösung von Entitäten, die in wissenschaftlichen Arbeiten und Zeitungsartikeln erwähnt werden, die sie diskutieren. Die Identifizierung derselben Entitäten und entsprechender Konzepte in wissenschaftlichen Artikeln und Nachrichten kann Wissenschaftlern helfen, zu verstehen, wie ihre Arbeit in den Mainstream-Medien dargestellt wird. Wir schlagen einen neuen Task- und englischsprachigen Datensatz für dokumentübergreifende Cross-Domain Co-Reference Resolution (CD2CR) vor. Die Aufgabe zielt darauf ab, Verbindungen zwischen Entitäten über heterogene Dokumententypen hinweg zu identifizieren. Wir zeigen, dass in dieser domänenübergreifenden, dokumentenübergreifenden Einstellung vorhandene CDCR-Modelle nicht gut funktionieren, und wir stellen ein Basismodell zur Verfügung, das aktuelle State-of-the-Art CDCR-Modelle auf CD2CR übertrifft. Unser Datensatz, unser Annotationstool und unsere Richtlinien sowie unser Modell für dokumentübergreifende domänenübergreifende Co-Referenz werden alle als Open Access Open Source Ressourcen bereitgestellt.', 'ko': 'CDCR(Content Reference Resulting) 작업은 여러 텍스트 문서에서 엔티티 및 개념에 대한 언급을 식별하고 링크하는 작업입니다.현재 이 작업에 사용되는 가장 선진적인 모델은 모든 문서가 같은 유형(예를 들어 뉴스 기사)에 속하거나 같은 주제에 속한다고 가정합니다.그러나 CDCR은 여러 도메인 (유형 또는 테마) 에서 실행되어야 합니다.우리가 본고에서 주목한 특정한 용례는 과학 업무와 그들의 신문 기사에서 언급한 실체의 해석이다.과학 문장과 뉴스에서 같은 실체와 상응하는 개념을 식별하면 과학자들이 그들의 업무가 주류 매체에서의 표현을 이해하도록 도와줄 수 있다.우리는 문서와 영역을 뛰어넘는 참고 해석 (CD2CR) 을 위한 새로운 작업과 영어 데이터 집합을 제시했다.이 작업의 목적은 이기종 문서 유형의 엔티티 간의 링크를 식별하는 것입니다.우리는 이러한 크로스 필드, 크로스 문서의 설정에서 기존의 CDCR 모델이 좋지 않다는 것을 나타낸다. 우리는 기선 모델을 제공하여 CD2CR에서 현재 가장 선진적인 CDCR 모델보다 우수하다.우리의 데이터 집합, 주석 도구와 안내서, 그리고 우리의 크로스 문서 크로스 공통 인용 모델은 모두 오픈 액세스 소스 자원으로 제공된다.', 'id': 'Resolusi koreferensi saling dokumen (CDCR) adalah tugas untuk mengidentifikasi dan menghubungkan sebutan kepada entitas dan konsep melalui banyak dokumen teks. Model state-of-the-art saat ini untuk tugas ini berasumsi bahwa semua dokumen adalah jenis yang sama (contohnya artikel berita) atau jatuh di bawah tema yang sama. Namun, juga diinginkan untuk melakukan CDCR melalui domain yang berbeda (tipe atau tema). Kasus penggunaan tertentu yang kita fokuskan di koran ini adalah resolusi entitas yang disebut di seluruh pekerjaan ilmiah dan artikel koran yang membahas mereka. Identifikasi entitas yang sama dan konsep yang sesuai dalam artikel ilmiah dan berita dapat membantu para ilmuwan memahami bagaimana pekerjaan mereka diwakili dalam media utama. We propose a new task and English language dataset for cross-document cross-domain co-reference resolution (CD2CR).  The task aims to identify links between entities across heterogeneous document types.  We show that in this cross-domain, cross-document setting, existing CDCR models do not perform well and we provide a baseline model that outperforms current state-of-the-art CDCR models on CD2CR.  Set data, alat annotasi dan panduan kami serta model kami untuk cross-document cross-domain koreferensi semua diberikan sebagai akses sumber terbuka.', 'sw': 'Cross-document co-reference resolution (CDCR) is the task of identifying and linking mentions to entities and concepts across many text documents.  Mfano wa hali ya sanaa kwa kazi hii unadhani kuwa nyaraka zote zimo katika aina moja (kwa mfano makala za habari) au kuanguka chini ya mada hiyo. Hata hivyo, inahitaji kufanya CDCR katika maeneo mbalimbali (aina au mada). Kesi fulani ya matumizi tunayolenga katika gazeti hili ni suluhisho la vyombo vinavyotajwa katika kazi za kisayansi na makala za magazeti zinazojadili. Kutambua vifaa hivyo na mawazo yanayojibu katika makala za kisayansi na habari zinaweza kusaidia wanasayansi kuelewa jinsi kazi zao zinavyowakilishwa katika vyombo vikuu vya habari. Tunapendekeza jukumu mpya na taarifa za lugha ya Kiingereza kwa ajili ya suluhisho la makubaliano yanayotokana na nyaraka za kote (CD2CR). Kazi hii inalenga kutambua viungo kati ya vitu vyote vinavyotokana na nyaraka tofauti. Tunaonyesha kwamba katika mazingira haya ya kupitia nyaraka, mifano ya CDCR yanayopo sasa hazifanyiki vizuri na tunatoa muundo wa msingi unaofanya mifano ya CDCR ya sasa ya sanaa kwenye CD2CR. Taarifa zetu zinatengenezwa, zana za kutangaza na miongozo pamoja na mtindo wetu wa kupitia nyaraka zinazohusiana kwa pamoja na maeneo yanapatikana kama rasilimali huru za upatikanaji wa vyanzo vya wazi.', 'hr': 'Prekrsno-dokumentarna usmjerena rezolucija (CDCR) je zadatak identifikacije i povezanja spomena s entitetima i konceptima u mnogim tekstskim dokumentima. Trenutni modeli state-of-the-art za ovaj zadatak pretpostavljaju da su svi dokumenti isti (npr. novinski članovi) ili pod istim temom. Međutim, također je željno izvršiti CDCR preko različitih domena (tipa ili teme). Posebni slučaj upotrebe na kojem se usredotočimo u ovom papiru je rezolucija entitata spomenuta preko znanstvenih radnih i novinskih članaka koji ih razgovaraju. Identificiranje istih entitata i odgovarajućih koncepta u znanstvenim člancima i vijestima mogu pomoći naučnicima da razumiju kako njihov rad predstavlja u glavnim medijima. Predlažemo novi zadatak i podaci engleskog jezika za korisnu rezoluciju preko domena (CD2CR). Cilj zadataka je identificirati veze između entitata preko heterogeneznih tipa dokumenta. Pokazujemo da u ovom prekršenom domenu postojećih model a CDCR-a ne ispunjavaju dobro i pružamo početni model koji iznosi trenutne modele CDCR-a na CD2CR-u. Naša kompleta podataka, alata za annotaciju i uputstva, kao i naš model za zajedničku referenciju preko domena preko dokumenta, sve su dostavljene kao otvorene resurse otvorenog pristupa izvora.', 'sq': 'Rezoluta ndërdokumentore e bashkëreferencës (CDCR) është detyra e identifikimit dhe lidhjes së përmendimeve me njësitë dhe konceptet nëpër shumë dokumente teksti. Current state-of-the-art models for this task assume that all documents are of the same type (e.g. news articles) or fall under the same theme.  Megjithatë, është gjithashtu e dëshirueshme të kryesh CDCR nëpër fusha të ndryshme (lloj apo tema). Një rast përdorimi në të cilin fokusohemi në këtë letër është zgjidhja e njësive të përmendura nëpër punën shkencore dhe artikujt e gazetave që i diskutojnë ato. Identifikimi i njëjtave njësi dhe koncepteve korrespondente si në artikujt shkencore ashtu edhe në lajmet mund të ndihmojë shkencëtarët të kuptojnë se si puna e tyre përfaqësohet në mediat kryesore. Ne propozojmë një grup të ri detyre dhe të dhënash në gjuhën angleze për rezolutën e bashkëreferencës ndër-dokumente në domeni (CD2CR). Detyra synon të identifikojë lidhjet midis njësive nëpërmjet tipeve heterogjene të dokumenteve. Ne tregojmë se në këtë përcaktimin e transdomenit, transdokumentit, modelet ekzistuese CDCR nuk funksionojnë mirë dhe ne ofrojmë një model bazë që ekziston mbi modelet aktuale të state-of-the-art CDCR në CD2CR. Gjendja jonë e të dhënave, mjeti dhe udhëzimet tona për anotacion si dhe modeli ynë për bashkëreferencën ndër-dokumente ndër-domeni janë të gjitha furnizuar si burime të hapura të hyrjes.', 'fa': 'گزینه\u200cهای متوسط سند (CDCR) وظیفه شناسایی و ارتباط اشاره\u200cها به عنوان واحدها و مفهومی در بسیاری از سند متن است. مدل\u200cهای موقعیت هنر فعلی برای این کار تصور می\u200cکند که همه مدل\u200cها از یک نوع (مثال مجموعه\u200cهای خبری) یا زیر یک موضوع پایین می\u200cشوند. با این حال، برای انجام CDCR در دامنهای مختلف (نوع یا عنوان) نیز می\u200cخواهد انجام دهد. یک مورد استفاده خاصی که ما روی این کاغذ تمرکز می\u200cکنیم، حل ساختاری است که در سراسر کارهای علمی و مجموعه\u200cهای روزنامه\u200cای که در موردشان بحث می\u200cکنند. شناسایی کردن یک عنوان و مفهوم مربوط به هر دو مقاله علمی و اخبار می تواند به دانشمندان کمک کند تا بفهمند چگونه کار آنها در رسانه های اصلی نمایش داده می شود. ما یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای زبان انگلیسی و وضعیت جدید برای حل\u200cسازی\u200cهای مختلف مدینه\u200cای (CD2CR) پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. هدف این است که ارتباط بین ارتباط\u200cها در نوع سند متفاوتی شناسایی کند. ما نشان می دهیم که در این تنظیم مدل\u200cهای CDCR موجود خوب انجام نمی\u200cدهند و مدل\u200cهای پایین\u200cخط که مدل\u200cهای CDCR فعلی در CD2CR را بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد. مجموعه داده\u200cهای ما، ابزار یادآوری و راهنمایی\u200cها و مدل\u200cهای ما برای همکاری از مدل\u200cهای مختلف مدینه\u200cای به عنوان منابع منبع باز دسترسی داده می\u200cشوند.', 'tr': "Çapraz sened ködleme çözümleri (CDCR) hatlary bir näçe metin senediň arasynda identifika we baglaşdyrmak üçin zady. Häzirki täblisaň durum-of-the-art nusgalarynyň hemme senediň bir hili bolandygyny çaklaýar (meselâ, täblis artikleri) ýada bir temada düşler. Ýagna görä CDCR'i farklı sahypalarda (hil ýa-da tema) ýerine ýetirmek isleýändir. Bu gazetde gurlanýan ýagdaýda üns berilýäris bilim işi we gazet makalarynyň suratynda ýazylýan hasaplanja. Aynı zatlary tanap we bilim makalarynda hem düşünjeleri bolsa düşünjeleri bilim adamlaryň işleriniň nähili medýäde täze edilýändigini düşünmesine kömek edip biler. Biz täze bir täze täze we iňlisçe dil datasyny çarpaz-döwlet çezilişi (CD2CR) üçin teklip edip görýäris Görev heterogenen sened hilleriň arasynda birbirleri baglaýyşy tanamak maksady. Biz bu cross-domain, cross-document düzümlerinde mevcut CDCR modelleri gowy edip bilmeýän we CD2CR'da häzirki taryh CDCR modellerini çykarýan baz modelleri temin ediyoruz. Bizim maglumat setmimiz, töwürlemek aralygy we gollanyşyklarymyz we çeşme-döwletler üçin modimiz ähli açyk açyk çeşme çeşmeleri üçin temin edildi.", 'af': "Kruis-dokument-verwysing-oplossing (CDCR) is die taak van identifiseer en verbind van bepaalde nommers na entiteite en konsepte oor baie teksdokumente. Huidige state- of- the- art modele vir hierdie taak aanvaar dat all e dokumente van dieselfde tipe (bv. nuus artikels) is of val onder dieselfde tema. Maar, dit is ook wil hê na uitvoer CDCR oor verskillende domeine (tipe of tema). 'n Besonder gebruik geval op wat ons in hierdie papier fokus is, is die oplossing van entiteite wat deur wetenskaplike werk en nuuspapier artikels gespreek word. Die identifiseer van dieselfde entiteite en ooreenstemmende konsepte in beide wetenskaplike artikels en nuus kan hulp wetenskappers om te verstaan hoe hulle werk in die onderstreemde media verteenwoordig is. Ons voorstel 'n nuwe taak en Engelstaal dataset vir kruis-dokument kruis-domein koverwysing oplossing (CD2CR). Die taak bepaal om skakels tussen entiteite te identifiseer oor heterogeneese dokumenttipes. Ons wys dat in hierdie kruis-domein, kruis-dokument instelling, bestaande CDCR modele doen nie goed uitvoer nie en ons verskaf 'n basilyn model wat uitvoer huidige staat-van-die-kuns-CDCR modele op CD2CR. Ons data stel, annotasie hulpmiddel en gidsline en ons model vir kruis-dokument kruis-domein-verwysing is almal verskaf as oop toegang oop bron hulpbronne.", 'am': 'መስኮት-ሰነድ ማቀናጃ (CDCR) ብዙዎች የጽሑፍ ሰነዶች እና ማሳየት እና ማሳየት ስርዓት ነው። የአሁኑን ሁኔታ-የ-አርእስት ዓይነት ለዚህ ስራ ሰነድ ሰነዱን ሁሉ በአንድ ዓይነት (ለምሳሌ የዜና ቃላት) ወይም በአንድ ጉዳይ ላይ ይወድቃሉ ብለው ያስባል። ነገር ግን CDCR በተለየ ውይይቶች ውስጥ (ዓይነት ወይም ጭብጥ) መፈጸም ይፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ ላይ የምናሳውቀው የፍጥረት ሥራ እና የጋዜጠኛ ገጽ ጽሑፎች ላይ የሚታወቀው አካላት መልስ ነው፡፡ በአንድ አካባቢዎች እና የሳይንቀሳዊ ጽሑፎች እና ዜናዎች የሥራቸውን በዋነኛው ሚዲያ እንዴት እንደተካፈለ እንዲያውቁ ይችላል፡፡ አዲስ ስራ እና የኢንግሊዝኛ ቋንቋ ዳታዎችን ለcross-ሰነድ-ዶሜን co-reference resolution (CD2CR) እናሳልቃለን፡፡ መልዕክት በዚህ በኩል-ድምፅ፣ የCDCR ሞዴዎች መልካም እንደማያሳየው እና በCD2CR ላይ የአሁኑን የCDCR ሥርዓት ሥርዓት የክፍለ ሥርዓት ሞዴላዎችን የሚያደርግ የbaseline ሞዴል እናሳየዋለን፡፡ የዳውሬታችን ዘርፍ፣ ማስታወቂያ ሀብት እና መግለጫችን እና የክፈት የክፍት የክፍት ምንጭ ሀብት እና የክፍተኛ ሰነድ ሰነድ አካባቢ እና ሞዴል ነው፡፡', 'hy': "Հաշվի առնելով փաստաթղթերը' բազմաթիվ տեքստի փաստաթղթերում հայտնաբերելու և կապելու խնդիրն է: Այս խնդրի ներկայիս ամենաբարձր մոդելները ենթադրում են, որ բոլոր փաստաթղթերը նույն տեսակի են (օրինակ նորությունների հոդվածներ) կամ ընկնում են նույն թեմայի տակ: Այնուամենայնիվ, նաև ցանկանալի է CDCD-ն կատարել տարբեր բնագավառներում (տեսակ կամ թեմա): Մի հատուկ օգտագործման դեպք, որի վրա մենք կենտրոնանում ենք այս թղթի մեջ, գիտական աշխատանքի և թերթերի հոդվածների մեջ նշված էության լուծումն է, որը քննարկում է դրանք: Նույն միավորների և համապատասխան գաղափարների հայտնաբերումը գիտական հոդվածներում և նորություններում կարող է օգնել գիտնականներին հասկանալ, թե ինչպես է իրենց աշխատանքը ներկայացված հիմնական լրատվամիջոցներում: Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր խնդիր և անգլերեն լեզվի տվյալների համակարգ, որոնք օգտագործվում են թղթերի միջև կատարվող համեմատական լուծումների համար (CD2C). Այս խնդիրը նպատակն է բացահայտել անհատականությունների միջև տարբեր փաստաթղթերի տեսակների կապերը: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս թվային, թվային փաստաթղթերի միջոցով գոյություն ունեցող CDCD-մոդելները լավ չեն աշխատում, և մենք ապահովում ենք հիմնական մոդել, որը գերազանցում է CD2CD-ի ներկայիս ամենաբարձր CDCD-մոդելները: Մեր տվյալների համակարգը, annoտացիայի գործիքը և ուղղությունները, ինչպես նաև մեր միջբեռի միջբեռի համեմատության մոդելը բոլորն էլ տրամադրվում են որպես բաց աղբեռի ռեսուրսներ:", 'az': "Xətt dökümlə birləşdirilmiş çözünürlük (CDCR) bir çox mətn dökümündə məlumatları tanıtmaq və bağlamaq məlumatıdır. Bu işin hökmünün vəzifəsi-o-sanat modellərinin bütün dökümlər eyni türündəndir (məsələlər, xəbərlər məsələlər) ya da eyni tema altında düşər. Lakin, CDCR də müxtəlif domeinlərdə (tür ya da tema) işləmək istəyir. Bu kağızda təsirli istifadə etdiyimiz məsələlər elmi işlər və gazet məsələləri arasında danışan məsələlərin çözünüşdür. Aynı məlumatları təşkil etmək və bilimsel məlumatların və xəbərlərin müqayisədə olan fikirləri bilimsimlərə öyrənməyə kömək edə bilər. Biz yeni iş və İngilizci dil verilənlərini çox-dökümət birləşdirilməsi üçün təklif edirik. Gözəl, heterogenel döküm növlərinin arasında bağlantıları tanımmaq istəyir. Biz bu çox-domani, çox-dövlət quruluşunda, mevcut CDCR modellərin yaxşı işləməsini göstəririk və CD2CR'də həmin CDCR modellərinin istifadə edilməsi üçün əsas çizgi modelləri təmin edirik. Bizim məlumatlarımız, məlumatlar vasitəsi və rəhbər çətinlərimiz, həmçinin çox-dökümət birləşdirilməsi üçün modellərimiz açıq açıq mənbə kaynaqları olaraq təmin edilmişdir.", 'bs': 'Prekrsni dokument je rezolucija koreferencije (CDCR) zadatak identifikacije i povezivanja spomena sa entitetima i konceptima u mnogim tekstskim dokumentima. Trenutni modeli state-of-the-art za ovaj zadatak pretpostavljaju da su svi dokumenti isti (npr. novinski članovi) ili pod istim temom. Međutim, također je željno izvršiti CDCR u različitim domenama (tipa ili tema). Posebni slučaj upotrebe na koji se usredotočimo u ovom novinama je rezolucija entitata spomenuta preko naučnog rada i novinskih članaka koji ih razgovaraju. Identifikacija istih entiteta i odgovarajućih koncepta u znanstvenim člancima i vijestima može pomoći naučnicima da shvate kako njihov rad predstavlja u glavnim medijima. Predlažemo novi zadatak i podaci engleskog jezika za korisnu rezoluciju preko domena (CD2CR). Taj zadatak je cilj identificirati veze između entitata preko heterogeneznih tipa dokumenta. Pokazujemo da u ovom prekršenom domenu postojećih model a CDCR-a ne izvršavaju dobro i pružamo početni model koji iznosi trenutne modele CDCR-a na CD2CR-u. Naša kompleta podataka, alata za annotaciju i uputstva, kao i naš model za zajedničku referenciju preko dokumenta, sve su dostavljene kao otvorene resurse izvora otvorenog pristupa.', 'ca': "La resolució de co-referència entre documents (CDCR) és la tasca d'identificar i vincular les mencions a entitats i conceptes en molts documents de text. Els models actuals d'última generació d'aquesta tasca suposen que tots els documents són del mateix tipus (per exemple, articles de notícies) o cauen sota el mateix tema. Però també és desitjable fer CDCR en dominis diferents (tipus o tema). Un cas particular en què ens centrem en aquest article és la resolució d'entitats mencionades en treballs científics i articles de diari que els discuten. Identificar les mateixes entitats i conceptes correspondents en articles científics i notícies pot ajudar als científics a entendre com es representa la seva feina als mitjans generals. Proposem una nova tasca i un conjunt de dades en llenguatge anglès per a una resolució de co-referència de dominis transversal (CD2CR). La tasca mira a identificar enllaços entre entitats entre tipus de documentos heterogènes. We show that in this cross-domain, cross-document setting, existing CDCR models do not perform well and we provide a baseline model that outperforms current state-of-the-art CDCR models on CD2CR.  El nostre conjunt de dades, eina d'anotació i directrius, com també el nostre model de codificació de dominys múltiples, estan proporcionats com recursos de codi obert d'accés.", 'bn': 'ক্রস-ডকুমেন্ট সহ-রেফারেন্স রিলেশন (সিডিসিআরি) অনেক টেক্সট ডকুমেন্টের মধ্যে উল্লেখ এবং উল্লেখকে চিহ্নিত করার কাজ। এই কাজের বর্তমান অবস্থা - শিল্পের মডেল অনুমান করে যে সকল নথিপত্র একই ধরনের (যেমন সংবাদ প্রবন্ধ) অথবা একই থিমের নীচে পড়ে। তবে বিভিন্ন ডোমেইনের সাথে সিডিসিআর প্রয়োজনীয় (ধরন অথবা থিম)। বিশেষ ব্যবহারের ক্ষেত্রে আমরা এই পত্রিকায় মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি বৈজ্ঞানিক কাজ এবং সংবাদপত্রের প্রবন্ধে উল্লেখ করা বস্তুর সি বৈজ্ঞানিক প্রবন্ধ এবং সংবাদ উভয়ের মধ্যে একই বস্তু পরিচিতি এবং সংশ্লিষ্ট ধারণা সাহায্য করতে পারে বিজ্ঞানীরা বুঝতে পারে কিভাবে  আমরা একটি নতুন কাজ এবং ইংরেজী ভাষার ডাটাসেট প্রস্তাব করছি ক্রাস-ডমেইন কোম্পেন সংক্রান্ত সিডি২CR (সিডি২CR)। এই কাজের উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে যে প্রত্যেক বস্তুর মধ্যে লিঙ্ক চিহ্নিত করা হয়েছে যার ফলে প্রতিষ্ঠিত নথির ধরনে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই ক্রাস-ডোমেইন, ক্রাস-ডকুমেন্ট বৈশিষ্ট্যে, বিদ্যমান সিডিসিআর মডেল ভালো করে না এবং আমরা একটি বেসেলাইন মডেল প্রদান করি যা সিডি২CR-এ বর্তম আমাদের তথ্য সেট, বিস্তারিত টুল এবং নির্দেশ এবং ক্রাস-ডমেইন ক্রস-ডোমেইন কোম্পানির জন্য আমাদের মডেল সকলেই উন্মুক্ত সোর্স সম', 'cs': 'Křížové referenční řešení (CDCR) je úkolem identifikovat a propojit zmínky s entitami a koncepty napříč mnoha textovými dokumenty. Současné nejmodernější modely pro tento úkol předpokládají, že všechny dokumenty jsou stejného typu (např. zpravodajské články) nebo spadají do stejného tématu. Je však také žádoucí provádět CDCR napříč různými doménami (typ nebo motiv). Konkrétním případem využití, na který se v tomto článku zaměřujeme, je řešení subjektů zmíněných napříč vědeckou prácí a novinovými články, které o nich diskutují. Identifikace stejných entit a odpovídajících konceptů ve vědeckých článcích i zprávách může vědcům pomoci porozumět tomu, jak je jejich práce zastoupena v mainstreamových médiích. Navrhujeme nový úlohový a anglický jazykový datový soubor pro cross-documents cross-domain co-reference resolution (CD2CR). Cílem úkolu je identifikovat vazby mezi entitami napříč heterogenními typy dokumentů. Ukázali jsme, že v tomto nastavení mezi různými doménami a dokumenty existující CDCR modely nefungují dobře a poskytujeme základní model, který předčí současné nejmodernější CDCR modely na CD2CR. Naše datová sada, anotace a pokyny, stejně jako náš model pro cross-dokument cross-domain korespondence jsou dodávány jako open source zdroje.', 'et': 'Dokumentidevahelise kaasviidete lahendamise ülesanne on tuvastada ja siduda märkused üksuste ja kontseptsioonidega paljudes tekstidokumentides. Selle ülesande praegused kaasaegsed mudelid eeldavad, et kõik dokumendid on sama tüüpi (nt uudisteartiklid) või kuuluvad sama teema alla. Siiski on soovitav teha CDCR erinevates domeenides (tüüp või teema). Konkreetne kasutusjuhtum, millele me keskendume käesolevas artiklis, on teaduslikes töödes ja ajaleheartiklites nimetatud üksuste lahendamine. Samade üksuste ja vastavate kontseptsioonide kindlakstegemine nii teaduslikes artiklites kui ka uudistes võib aidata teadlastel mõista, kuidas nende tööd tavameedias esindatakse. Pakume välja uue ülesande ja ingliskeelse andmekogumi dokumentidevahelise domeenidevahelise kaasviite resolutsiooni (CD2CR) jaoks. Ülesande eesmärk on tuvastada üksuste vahelised seosed erinevate dokumentitüüpide vahel. Näitame, et selles valdkondadevahelises dokumentidevahelises seadistuses ei toimi olemasolevad CDCR-mudelid hästi ja pakume baasmudelit, mis ületab CD2CR-i praeguseid kaasaegseid CDCR-mudeleid. Meie andmekogum, märkuste tööriist ja juhised ning meie dokumentidevahelise domeenidevahelise kaasviite mudel on kõik pakutud avatud juurdepääsuga avatud lähtekoodiga ressurssidena.', 'fi': 'Cross-document co-reference resolution (CDCR) on tehtävä tunnistaa ja linkittää maininnat kokonaisuuksiin ja käsitteisiin monissa tekstiasiakirjoissa. Nykyaikaiset tämän tehtävän uusimmat mallit olettavat, että kaikki asiakirjat ovat samantyyppisiä (esim. uutisartikkeleita) tai kuuluvat samaan teemaan. On kuitenkin toivottavaa, että CDCR suoritetaan eri toimialueilla (tyyppi tai teema). Tässä artikkelissa keskitytään erityisesti sellaisten tahojen ratkaisuun, jotka mainitaan tieteellisessä työssä ja niitä käsittelevissä sanomalehtiartikkeleissa. Samojen kokonaisuuksien ja vastaavien käsitteiden tunnistaminen sekä tieteellisissä artikkeleissa että uutisissa voi auttaa tutkijoita ymmärtämään, miten heidän työnsä on edustettuna valtamediassa. Ehdotamme uutta tehtävä- ja englanninkielistä aineistoa dokumenttien väliseen yhteisviiteresoluutioon (CD2CR). Tehtävän tavoitteena on tunnistaa eri dokumenttityyppien kokonaisuuksien väliset linkit. Osoitamme, että tässä monialaisessa, dokumenttien välisessä asetuksessa olemassa olevat CDCR-mallit eivät toimi hyvin ja tarjoamme perusmallin, joka ylittää nykyiset CDCR-mallit CD2CR:ssä. Tietoaineistomme, huomautustyökalumme ja ohjeistuksemme sekä mallimme dokumenttien väliselle yhteisreferenssille toimitetaan avoimen lähdekoodin resursseina.', 'ha': "@ action: button Tilas na halin-sanar yanzu wa wannan aikin na yi zato, duk takardar aiki na daidaita (misali, da abun lãbãri) ko su fãɗi a ƙarƙashin jigon wannan. A lokacin haka, ana ƙayyade in tafiyar da CDCR a kowace jama'a guda (nau'i ko jigon). Babu amfani da wani abu wanda Muke fokusar a cikin wannan takarda, shi ne rabon abubuwa da ake faɗa a tsakanin aikin sayansi da takardar newspaper da ke yin musu. Ina iya gane masu sami da idãnun da suke daidai a cikin takardan masu sayani da lãbãri, sune iya taimakon sayanta su fahimta yadda ake nuna aikin su a cikin mitandan muhimmada. Tuna goyyade wani aikin da aka shigar da data na harshen Ingiriya wa tsakanin-takardar-kode-Domen-co-Reference (CD2CR). Yin aikin ya yi aimar ka gane linki tsakanin abubuwa kowace takardar wata dabam. Tuna nuna cewa, cikin wannan shirin-guda, shirin kode-dokumenta, misãlai masu jira na CDCR bã su tafiyar da alhẽri kuma muna samar da wani motel na ƙarƙashin bango wanda ke samar da tsarin-halin-da-art-CDCR kan CD2CR. Ana ƙayyade tsarin danganmu, zanen zartar da shiryarwa da shiryoyinmu da misãlai wa kowace-takardar-kowace-sami-sami-misalin dukansu an ba da su zama zance-zane buɗe.", 'jv': 'Multiple-document co-reference Resolution Sayensi politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Perintah sing dipunangé awak dhéwé dipunangé ning mapun iki dadi, kuwi Resolusi ingkang dipunangé awak dhéwé kuwi tindakan online karo perintah sing nyeangno karo perintah dhéwé. Nambah nambah kang sampeyan nganggo cah-sampeyan sampeyan ingkang sampeyan Artik Sayensi lan barang bantuan iso nglanggar alim-siyengan kuwi ngerasahan piye basa gambar obah-siyengan saiki dipunasabé ning media siyeng maneh. We proposal a new task and engleslanguage dataset for inter-document inter-domain co-reference Resolution (cd2C). task Awak dhéwé ngomong nik karo-domain, karo-dokumen seturan, model cdcd sing dumateng ora bisa ngono model sing ditambah barang nggawe barang dhéwé, iso disebarke model sing ditambah state-of-the-arts We data set, anntation tool and guideline as long as we model for inter-document inter-domain co-reference are all given as open access open source files.', 'sk': 'Reševanje navzkrižnih referenčnih dokumentov (CDCR) je naloga prepoznavanja in povezovanja omemb z entitetami in koncepti v številnih besedilnih dokumentih. Trenutni najsodobnejši modeli za to opravilo predvidevajo, da so vsi dokumenti iste vrste (npr. novinarski članki) ali spadajo pod isto temo. Vendar pa je zaželeno tudi izvajanje CDCR v različnih domenah (vrsta ali tema). Poseben primer uporabe, na katerega se osredotočamo v tem prispevku, je reševanje subjektov, omenjenih v znanstvenem delu in časopisnih člankih, ki o njih razpravljajo. Identifikacija istih subjektov in ustreznih konceptov v znanstvenih člankih in novicah lahko znanstvenikom pomaga razumeti, kako je njihovo delo predstavljeno v glavnih medijih. Predlagamo novo nalogo in nabor podatkov v angleškem jeziku za ločljivost meddomenskih referenc (CD2CR). Cilj naloge je prepoznati povezave med entitetami v različnih vrstah dokumentov. Pokazali smo, da obstoječi modeli CDCR v tej meddomenski, meddokumentni nastavitvi ne delujejo dobro in zagotavljamo osnovni model, ki presega sedanje najsodobnejše modele CDCR na CD2CR. Naš nabor podatkov, orodje za označevanje in smernice ter naš model meddomenskega referenčnega meddokumenta so vsi na voljo kot odprtokodni viri.', 'he': 'פיתרון שיתוף התייחסות בין מסמכים (CDCR) הוא המשימה לזהות ולהקשר זיכרונות ליחידות ומחשבות בין מסמכים טקסטים רבים. מודלים חדשים הנוכחים למשימה זו מניחים שכל המסמכים הם באותו סוג (למשל מאמרים חדשות) או נופלים באותו נושא. בכל אופן, זה גם רצוי לבצע CDCR באזור שונה (סוג או נושא). תיק שימוש מסוים שאנחנו מתמקדים בו בעיתון הזה הוא הפתרון של ישויות שמזכירות ברחבי עבודה מדעית ומאמרי עיתון שדונים עליהם. זיהוי אותם יחידות ומחשבות מתאימים במאמרים מדעיים ובחדשות יכולים לעזור למדענים להבין איך העבודה שלהם מייצגת בתקשורת המרכזית. אנו מציעים משימה חדשה וקבוצת נתונים בשפה אנגלית עבור ריזולוציה משותפת בין המסמכים (CD2CR). המשימה מתכוונת לזהות קשרים בין יחידות בין סוגי מסמכים heterogeneous. אנחנו מראים שבסדרת חוצה-שדה, חוצה-מסמכים הזאת, דוגמנים CDCR קיימים לא מצליחים להצליח היטב ואנחנו מספקים דוגמנים בסיסיים שמצפים על דוגמנים CDCR מצוינים כרגע על CD2CR. קבוצת הנתונים שלנו, כלי הערות והכיוונים, וגם המודל שלנו לשיתוף בין תרגומות חוצה מסמכים, כולם מספקים כמשאבי גישה פתוחים מקור פתוח.', 'bo': 'Cross-document co-reference resolution (CDCR) is the task of identifying and linking mentions to entities and concepts across many text documents. Current state-of-the-art models for this task assume that all documents are of the same type (e.g. news articles) or fall under the same theme. ཡིན་ནའང་། domains་མི་འདྲ་བའི་ནང་དུ་CDCR འི་སྒེར་སྤྱོད་བྱེད་རྩོལ་བ་ཡིན་པ ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱས་པ་ཞིག་ནི་ཚན་རིག ཚན་རིག We propose a new task and English language data set for cross-document cross-domain co-reference resolution (CD2CR). ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་བསྒྱུར་རུང་བའི་ཡིག་ཆ་དབྱེ་བ་དང་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དམིགས་ཡུལ་འདུག We show that in this cross-domain, cross-document setting, existing CDCR models do not perform well and we provide a baseline model that outperforms current state-of-the-art CDCR models on CD2CR. Our data set, annotation tool and guidelines as well as our model for cross-document cross-domain co-reference are all supplied as open access open source resources.'}
{'en': 'Recipes for Building an Open-Domain Chatbot', 'ar': 'وصفات لبناء Chatbot مفتوح المجال', 'es': 'Recetas para crear un chatbot de dominio abierto', 'fr': 'Recettes pour créer un chatbot de domaine ouvert', 'pt': 'Receitas para construir um chatbot de domínio aberto', 'zh': '构开域聊天机器人秘诀', 'ja': 'オープンドメインのチャットボットを構築するためのレシピ', 'ru': 'Рецепты создания чат-бота с открытым доменом', 'hi': 'एक ओपन-डोमेन चैटबॉट बनाने के लिए व्यंजनों', 'ga': 'Recipes chun Chatbot Fearainn Oscailte a Thógáil', 'hu': 'Receptek egy nyílt tartományú csevegőbot építéséhez', 'el': 'Συνταγές για τη δημιουργία ενός Chatbot ανοιχτού τομέα', 'it': 'Ricette per costruire un chatbot a dominio aperto', 'ka': 'Name', 'kk': 'Name', 'mk': 'Рецепти за изградба на отворен домен разговор', 'ml': 'ഒരു തുറന്ന ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ചാറ്റ്ബോട്ട് പണിയുന്നതിനുള്ള റിപ്പിക്കുകള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Riċetti għall-bini ta’ chat box b’dominju miftuħ', 'mn': 'Open-Domain Chatbot бүтээх Recipes for Building an Open-Domain Chatbot', 'no': 'Rezepter for bygging av eit opna domeneprattbot', 'pl': 'Przepisy na budowę chatbota otwartej domeny', 'ro': 'Rețete pentru construirea unui Chatbot cu domeniu deschis', 'sr': 'Recipi za izgradnju otvorenog domena Chatbota', 'ms': 'Resip untuk Bina Bot Sembang Domain Buka', 'si': 'Name', 'lt': 'Atviro domeno pokalbio kūrimo receptai', 'so': 'Dalbashada Building a Open Domain Chatbot', 'sv': 'Recept för att bygga en chattbot med öppen domän', 'ur': 'Name', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Công thức cho việc làm một con robot công nghệ', 'hr': 'Recipe za izgradnju otvorenog domena Chatbota', 'bg': 'Рецепти за изграждане на чат бот с отворен домейн', 'nl': 'Recepten voor het bouwen van een open-domein chatbot', 'da': 'Opskrifter til opbygning af en chatbot med åbent domæne', 'de': 'Rezepte für den Aufbau eines Open-Domain Chatbots', 'id': 'Resip untuk membangun pembicaraan Domain terbuka', 'sw': 'Makasiliano kwa ajili ya kujenga Chatbot Huru ya Domain', 'ko': '개방역 채팅 로봇을 구축하는 방법', 'fa': 'رساله\u200cها برای ساختن یک چاتبت دامنی باز', 'tr': 'Açmak üçin nusgalar', 'sq': 'Reçipe për ndërtimin e një diskutimi me domini të hapur', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'af': "Recipes vir bou van 'n Open- Domein Chatbot", 'hy': 'Բաց վայրի զրույցի կառուցման բաղադրատոմսներ', 'bn': 'একটি খোলা ডোমেইন চ্যাটবোট নির্মাণের জন্য রিপিপিট', 'ca': 'Recetes per a construir un cotxe de conversa en domini obert', 'bs': 'Recipi za izgradnju otvorenog domena Chatbota', 'cs': 'Recepty na vytvoření chatbota s otevřenou doménou', 'et': 'Retseptid avatud domeeniga vestlusboti loomiseks', 'fi': 'Reseptejä avoimen verkkotunnuksen chatbotin rakentamiseen', 'az': 'Açıq Domain Chatbot inşası üçün məlumatlar', 'jv': 'Name', 'sk': 'Recepti za gradnjo klepetalnega bota z odprto domeno', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מתכונים לבניין שטוח שיחה במשפחה פתוחה', 'bo': 'Recipes for Building an Open-Domain Chatbot'}
{'en': 'Building open-domain chatbots is a challenging area for machine learning research. While prior work has shown that scaling neural models in the number of parameters and the size of the data they are trained on gives improved results, we highlight other ingredients. Good conversation requires blended skills : providing engaging talking points, and displaying knowledge, empathy and personality appropriately, while maintaining a consistent persona. We show that large scale models can learn these skills when given appropriate training data and choice of generation strategy. We build variants of these recipes with 90 M, 2.7B and 9.4B parameter models, and make our models and code publicly available. Human evaluations show our best models outperform existing approaches in multi-turn dialogue on engagingness and humanness measurements. We then discuss the limitations of this work by analyzing failure cases of our models.', 'pt': 'A construção de chatbots de domínio aberto é uma área desafiadora para a pesquisa de aprendizado de máquina. Embora trabalhos anteriores tenham mostrado que dimensionar modelos neurais no número de parâmetros e no tamanho dos dados em que são treinados fornece melhores resultados, destacamos outros ingredientes. Uma boa conversa requer habilidades combinadas: fornecer pontos de discussão envolventes e exibir conhecimento, empatia e personalidade de forma adequada, mantendo uma personalidade consistente. Mostramos que modelos de grande escala podem aprender essas habilidades quando recebem dados de treinamento apropriados e escolha da estratégia de geração. Construímos variantes dessas receitas com modelos de parâmetros de 90M, 2.7B e 9.4B e disponibilizamos nossos modelos e códigos publicamente. As avaliações humanas mostram que nossos melhores modelos superam as abordagens existentes no diálogo multi-turn sobre medidas de engajamento e humanidade. Em seguida, discutimos as limitações deste trabalho analisando casos de falha de nossos modelos.', 'ar': 'يعد بناء روبوتات محادثة مفتوحة المجال مجالًا صعبًا لأبحاث التعلم الآلي. بينما أظهر العمل السابق أن قياس النماذج العصبية في عدد المعلمات وحجم البيانات التي تم تدريبهم عليها يعطي نتائج محسّنة ، فإننا نسلط الضوء على المكونات الأخرى. تتطلب المحادثة الجيدة مهارات مختلطة: توفير نقاط حوار جذابة ، وإظهار المعرفة والتعاطف والشخصية بشكل مناسب ، مع الحفاظ على شخصية متسقة. نظهر أن النماذج الكبيرة يمكن أن تتعلم هذه المهارات عند إعطائها بيانات التدريب المناسبة واختيار استراتيجية التوليد. نقوم ببناء متغيرات من هذه الوصفات بنماذج معلمات 90M و 2.7B و 9.4B ، ونجعل نماذجنا ورموزنا متاحة للجمهور. تُظهر التقييمات البشرية أن أفضل نماذجنا تتفوق في الأداء على المناهج الحالية في الحوار متعدد الأدوار حول قياسات المشاركة والإنسانية. ثم نناقش حدود هذا العمل من خلال تحليل حالات فشل نماذجنا.', 'es': 'La creación de chatbots de dominio abierto es un área desafiante para la investigación del aprendizaje automático. Si bien trabajos anteriores han demostrado que escalar los modelos neuronales en el número de parámetros y el tamaño de los datos con los que se entrenan proporciona mejores resultados, destacamos otros ingredientes. Una buena conversación requiere habilidades combinadas: proporcionar puntos de conversación interesantes y mostrar conocimiento, empatía y personalidad de manera adecuada, mientras se mantiene una personalidad coherente. Demostramos que los modelos a gran escala pueden aprender estas habilidades cuando reciben los datos de capacitación adecuados y la elección de la estrategia de generación. Creamos variantes de estas recetas con modelos de parámetros de 90M, 2.7B y 9.4B, y hacemos que nuestros modelos y códigos estén disponibles públicamente. Las evaluaciones humanas muestran que nuestros mejores modelos superan a los enfoques existentes en el diálogo de múltiples turnos sobre las mediciones de implicación y humanidad. Luego discutimos las limitaciones de este trabajo analizando los casos de falla de nuestros modelos.', 'fr': "La création de chatbots de domaine ouvert est un domaine difficile pour la recherche sur l'apprentissage automatique. Alors que des travaux antérieurs ont montré que la mise à l'échelle des modèles neuronaux en fonction du nombre de paramètres et de la taille des données sur lesquelles ils sont entraînés donne de meilleurs résultats, nous soulignons d'autres ingrédients. Une bonne conversation nécessite des compétences mixtes\xa0: fournir des points de discussion attrayants et faire preuve de connaissances, d'empathie et de personnalité de manière appropriée, tout en maintenant une personnalité cohérente. Nous montrons que les modèles à grande échelle peuvent acquérir ces compétences lorsqu'ils disposent de données d'entraînement appropriées et d'un choix de stratégie de génération. Nous créons des variantes de ces recettes avec des modèles de paramètres 90M, 2,7B et 9,4B, et rendons nos modèles et notre code accessibles au public. Les évaluations humaines montrent que nos meilleurs modèles surpassent les approches existantes dans le dialogue multi-tours sur l'engagement et les mesures de l'humanité. Nous discutons ensuite des limites de ce travail en analysant les cas de défaillance de nos modèles.", 'zh': '构开域聊天机器人于机器学为挑战性域。 虽前所研明,参数数大小缩放神经模形可改,然强其他分。 良言混合:引人入胜言要,同理心,同角色。 宜给定练数成策,大可学也。 吾以 90M、2.7B 、 9.4B 参数为之方变体,明吾代码。 人之评估,在参与度与人性化多轮次对话优于今法。 然后因分析模型之败以论其局限性。', 'ja': 'オープンドメインのチャットボットを構築することは、機械学習研究にとって困難な領域です。以前の研究では、ニューラルモデルをパラメータの数と訓練されたデータのサイズでスケーリングすると、改善された結果が得られることが示されていましたが、他の要素を強調しています。優れた会話には、魅力的な会話ポイントを提供し、知識、共感、個性を適切に表示すると同時に、一貫したペルソナを維持するという、ブレンドされたスキルが必要です。大規模モデルは、適切なトレーニングデータと生成戦略の選択を与えられた場合に、これらのスキルを学ぶことができることを示しています。90 M、2.7B、9.4Bのパラメータモデルでこれらのレシピのバリエーションを構築し、モデルとコードを公開します。人間の評価は、エンゲージメントと人間性の測定に関する複数ターンの対話において、当社の最高のモデルが既存のアプローチを上回ることを示しています。そして、モデルの故障事例を分析して、本作業の限界について考察します。', 'hi': 'ओपन-डोमेन चैटबॉट्स का निर्माण मशीन लर्निंग रिसर्च के लिए एक चुनौतीपूर्ण क्षेत्र है। जबकि पहले के काम से पता चला है कि पैरामीटर की संख्या में स्केलिंग तंत्रिका मॉडल और डेटा के आकार में उन्हें प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है, बेहतर परिणाम देता है, हम अन्य अवयवों को उजागर करते हैं। अच्छी बातचीत के लिए मिश्रित कौशल की आवश्यकता होती है: आकर्षक बात करने वाले बिंदु प्रदान करना, और ज्ञान, सहानुभूति और व्यक्तित्व को उचित रूप से प्रदर्शित करना, जबकि एक सुसंगत व्यक्तित्व को बनाए रखना। हम दिखाते हैं कि बड़े पैमाने पर मॉडल इन कौशलों को सीख सकते हैं जब उचित प्रशिक्षण डेटा और पीढ़ी की रणनीति की पसंद दी जाती है। हम 90M, 2.7B और 9.4B पैरामीटर मॉडल के साथ इन व्यंजनों के संस्करणों का निर्माण करते हैं, और हमारे मॉडल और कोड को सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध कराते हैं। मानव मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि हमारे सबसे अच्छे मॉडल आकर्षकता और मानवता माप पर बहु-बारी संवाद में मौजूदा दृष्टिकोणों को बेहतर बनाते हैं। फिर हम अपने मॉडल की विफलता के मामलों का विश्लेषण करके इस काम की सीमाओं पर चर्चा करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Создание чат-ботов с открытым доменом - сложная область для исследований в области машинного обучения. Хотя предыдущая работа показала, что масштабирование нейронных моделей по количеству параметров и размеру данных, на которых они обучены, дает улучшенные результаты, мы выделяем другие ингредиенты. Хорошая беседа требует смешанных навыков: предоставление интересных вопросов для обсуждения и надлежащее отображение знаний, сопереживания и личности, при этом поддерживая последовательную личность. Мы показываем, что крупномасштабные модели могут выучить эти навыки при наличии соответствующих данных обучения и выбора стратегии генерации. Мы создаем варианты этих рецептов с ПАРАМЕТРИЧЕСКИМИ моделями 90M, 2.7B и 9.4B и делаем наши модели и код общедоступными. Человеческие оценки показывают, что наши лучшие модели превосходят существующие подходы в многооборотном диалоге по измерениям вовлеченности и человечности. Затем мы обсуждаем ограничения этой работы, анализируя случаи отказов наших моделей.', 'ga': 'Réimse dúshlánach do thaighde meaisínfhoghlama é chatbots fearainn oscailte a thógáil. Cé gur léirigh réamhobair go dtugann scálaithe samhlacha néaracha i líon na bparaiméadar agus méid na sonraí ar a bhfuil siad oilte torthaí feabhsaithe, leagaimid béim ar chomhábhair eile. Bíonn scileanna cumaisc de dhíth ar chomhrá maith: pointí cainte tarraingteacha a sholáthar, agus eolas, comhbhá agus pearsantacht a léiriú go cuí, agus pearsantacht chomhsheasmhach a chothabháil. Léirímid gur féidir le samhlacha mórscála na scileanna seo a fhoghlaim nuair a thugtar sonraí oiliúna cuí agus rogha straitéis giniúna dóibh. Déanaimid leaganacha de na hoidis seo a thógáil le samhlacha paraiméadar 90M, 2.7B agus 9.4B, agus cuirimid ár samhlacha agus ár gcód ar fáil go poiblí. Léiríonn meastóireachtaí daonna go sáraíonn ár múnlaí is fearr na cineálacha cur chuige atá ann cheana féin in idirphlé il-uaine ar rannpháirtíocht agus tomhais daonnachta. Déanaimid plé ansin ar theorainneacha na hoibre seo trí anailís a dhéanamh ar chásanna teipe ar ár múnlaí.', 'el': 'Η κατασκευή ανοικτού τομέα είναι ένας προκλητικός τομέας για την έρευνα μηχανικής μάθησης. Ενώ προηγούμενες εργασίες έχουν δείξει ότι η κλιμάκωση των νευρωνικών μοντέλων στον αριθμό των παραμέτρων και το μέγεθος των δεδομένων στα οποία εκπαιδεύονται δίνει βελτιωμένα αποτελέσματα, επισημαίνουμε άλλα συστατικά. Η καλή συνομιλία απαιτεί μικτές δεξιότητες: παροχή συναρπαστικών σημείων συζήτησης και επίδειξη γνώσεων, ενσυναίσθησης και προσωπικότητας κατάλληλα, διατηρώντας παράλληλα μια συνεπή προσωπικότητα. Δείχνουμε ότι τα μοντέλα μεγάλης κλίμακας μπορούν να μάθουν αυτές τις δεξιότητες όταν δίνονται κατάλληλα δεδομένα κατάρτισης και επιλογή στρατηγικής παραγωγής. Κατασκευάζουμε παραλλαγές αυτών των συνταγών με μοντέλα παραμέτρων 90και 2.7και 9.4και κάνουμε τα μοντέλα και τον κώδικα μας δημόσια διαθέσιμα. Οι ανθρώπινες αξιολογήσεις δείχνουν ότι τα καλύτερα μοντέλα μας ξεπερνούν τις υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις σε διάλογο πολλαπλών στροφών σχετικά με τις μετρήσεις εμπλοκής και ανθρωπιάς. Στη συνέχεια συζητάμε τους περιορισμούς αυτής της εργασίας αναλύοντας περιπτώσεις αποτυχίας των μοντέλων μας.', 'ka': 'გახსნილი დიომინის ქარბოტების შექმნა არის მაქინის სწავლებისთვის შესაძლებელი საზოგადოება. წინა სამუშაო მუშაო მუშაობა, რომ ნეიროლური მოდელების მანძილის მანძილის მანძილის მანძილის მანძილის და მონაცემების მანძილის მანძილის მანძილის მანძი კარგი პარამეტრები უნდა შესაბამისი მეცნიერება: საუკეთესო საუკეთესო საუკეთესო საუკეთესო საუკეთესო საუკეთესო საუკეთესო საუკეთესო სა ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ დიდი მარტილის მოდელები შეიძლება ამ მეცნიერების შესწავლობა, როდესაც შესაძლებელი განაკეთებული მონაცემები და მონიშნე გან ჩვენ შევქმნით ამ რერესტის განრამეტრები 90M, 2.7B და 9.4B პარამეტრის მოდელებით და ჩვენი მოდელები და კოდის ადგილურად ხელხილებით. ადამიანის განსაზღვრებები ჩვენი უკეთესი მოდელები გავაკეთებენ მრავალური განსაზღვრებით და ადამიანის განსაზღვრებით. შემდეგ ჩვენ ამ სამუშაო მდგომარების შედგომარების განსაზღვრებით ანალიზაციით ჩვენი მოდელების შედგომარებით.', 'hu': 'A nyílt domain chatbotok építése kihívást jelent a gépi tanulási kutatások számára. Míg a korábbi munkák kimutatták, hogy az idegi modellek skálázása a paraméterek számában és a képzett adatok méretében jobb eredményeket eredményez, kiemeljük a többi összetevőt. A jó beszélgetés kombinált készségeket igényel: vonzó beszélgetési pontok biztosítása, tudás, empátia és személyiség megfelelő megjelenítése, miközben következetes személyiség fenntartása mellett. Megmutatjuk, hogy a nagyszabású modellek megtanulhatják ezeket a készségeket, ha megfelelő képzési adatokat és generációs stratégiát választanak. Ezeknek a recepteknek a változatait 90M, 2.7B és 9.4B paramétermodellekkel építjük, modelleinket és kódjainkat nyilvánosan elérhetővé tesszük. Az emberi értékelések azt mutatják, hogy a legjobb modelleink felülmúlják a meglévő megközelítéseket a többfordulós párbeszéd során az érintettség és az emberiség méréséről. Ezután megvitatjuk a munka korlátait modelleink hibaeseteinek elemzésével.', 'it': "Costruire chatbot a dominio aperto è un'area impegnativa per la ricerca sull'apprendimento automatico. Mentre il lavoro precedente ha dimostrato che scalare i modelli neurali nel numero di parametri e la dimensione dei dati su cui sono addestrati dà risultati migliori, evidenziamo altri ingredienti. Una buona conversazione richiede competenze miste: fornire punti di conversazione coinvolgenti e mostrare conoscenza, empatia e personalità in modo appropriato, mantenendo un personaggio coerente. Mostriamo che i modelli su larga scala possono imparare queste abilità quando vengono forniti dati di formazione adeguati e scelta della strategia di generazione. Costruiamo varianti di queste ricette con modelli di parametri 90M, 2.7B e 9.4B, e rendiamo pubblici i nostri modelli e codice. Le valutazioni umane mostrano che i nostri migliori modelli superano gli approcci esistenti nel dialogo multi-turn sulle misure di coinvolgimento e umanità. Discutiamo poi i limiti di questo lavoro analizzando i casi di fallimento dei nostri modelli.", 'kk': 'Ашық- домендегі сұхбаттарды құру - машиналық оқыту үшін әсер ететін аумағы. Алдыңғы жұмыс жақсы нәтижелердің параметрлерінің саны мен оқылған деректерінің өлшемі жақсы нәтижелерді өзгертуге болады дегенді көрсетті, біз басқа ingrediенттерді таңдаймыз. Жақсы сұрақтар біріктірілген жұмыс істерін талап етеді: сөйлейтін нүктелер және білім, импатиялық және өзімділігін жақсы көрсету және тұрақты адамды сақтау кезінде. Біз үлкен масштаб үлгілерінің оқыту мәліметтерін және құрылғы стратегиясын таңдағанда оқыту мүмкіндігін көрсетедік. Біз бұл рецептерді 90M, 2, 7B және 9, 4B параметрлер үлгілерімен құрып, моделдерімізді және кодымызды жалпы түрде қол жеткіземіз. Адам оқу үлгілеріміздің ең жақсы үлгілеріміздің көпшілікті диалогында көпшілікті және адамдардың өлшемдеріне қатынау диалогында болатынын көрсетеді. Содан кейін бұл жұмысының шектеулерін өзіміздің үлгілеріміздің жаңылыс жағдайларды анализ көмегімен талқылаймыз.', 'lt': 'Atviros srities chatbotų kūrimas yra sunki sritis mašinų mokymosi moksliniams tyrimams. Nors ankstesnis darbas parodė, kad nustatant parametrų skaičių ir jų apmokomų duomenų dydį nustatomi neurologiniai modeliai duoda geresnių rezultatų, mes pabrėžiame kitas sudedamąsias dalis. Good conversation requires blended skills: providing engaging talking points, and displaying knowledge, empathy and personality appropriately, while maintaining a consistent persona.  Mes rodome, kad didelio masto modeliai gali pasimokyti tokių įgūdžių, kai suteikiami tinkami mokymo duomenys ir kartos pasirinkimo strategija. Kuriame šių receptų variantus naudojant 90M, 2.7B ir 9.4B parametrų modelius ir viešai paskelbiame savo modelius ir kodus. Žmogaus vertinimai rodo, kad mūsų geriausi modeliai yra didesni už esamus metodus daugiametiame dialoge dėl įsitraukimo ir žmogiškumo matavimo. We then discuss the limitations of this work by analyzing failure cases of our models.', 'mk': 'Градењето на отворени chatbots е предизвикна област за истражување на машинско учење. While prior work has shown that scaling neural models in the number of parameters and the size of the data they are trained on gives improved results, we highlight other ingredients.  Добар разговор бара мешани вештини: обезбедување интересни точки на разговор, и соодветно покажување на знаење, емпатија и личност, при што се одржува константна личност. Ние покажуваме дека големи модели можат да ги научат овие вештини кога даваат соодветни податоци за обука и избор на генерација стратегија. Создаваме варијанти од овие рецепти со модели од параметри 90M, 2.7B и 9.4B, и ги правиме нашите модели и кодови јавно достапни. Човечките проценки покажуваат дека нашите најдобри модели ги надминуваат постоечките пристапи во повеќекратниот дијалог за проценките на ангажитетот и човештвото. Потоа разговараме за ограничувањата на оваа работа со анализирање на случаите на неуспех на нашите модели.', 'ms': 'Bina chatbot domain terbuka adalah kawasan yang menantang untuk kajian pembelajaran mesin. Sementara kerja sebelumnya telah menunjukkan bahawa skala model saraf dalam bilangan parameter dan saiz data yang mereka dilatih memberikan keputusan yang lebih baik, kita menyatakan bahan-bahan lain. Percakapan yang baik memerlukan keterampilan bercampur: menyediakan titik bercakap yang menarik, dan memaparkan pengetahuan, empati dan kepribadian dengan sesuai, sementara menjaga kepribadian yang konsisten. Kami menunjukkan bahawa model skala besar boleh belajar keterampilan ini apabila diberi data latihan yang sesuai dan pilihan strategi generasi. Kami membina varian resep ini dengan model parameter 90M, 2.7B dan 9.4B, dan membuat model dan kod kami tersedia kepada masyarakat. Evaluasi manusia menunjukkan model terbaik kita melebihi pendekatan yang wujud dalam dialog berbilang-putaran mengenai ketertarikan dan pengukuran kemanusiaan. We then discuss the limitations of this work by analyzing failure cases of our models.', 'ml': 'തുറന്ന ഡൊമൈന്\u200d ചട്ട്ബോട്ടുകള്\u200d പണിയുന്നത് യന്ത്ര പഠന പഠിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വിലപാടുകളാണ്. ഇതിനു മുമ്പ് ജോലി കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d നെയൂറല്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ എണ്ണത്തിലും പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന ഡേറ്റാകളുടെ വലി നന്നായി സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിന് മുറിവുള്ള കഴിവുകള്\u200d ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്: സംസാരിക്കുന്ന പോയിന്റുകള്\u200d കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനും അറിവുകള്\u200d കാ നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊടുക്കുന്നത് വലിയ സ്കാല്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് ഈ കഴിവുകള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുമെന്നാണ്  90M, 2.7B, 9.4B പാരാമീറ്റര്\u200d മോഡലുകളുമായി നമ്മുടെ മോഡലുകളും കോഡുകളും പ്രത്യേകം ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നു. മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല മോഡലുകള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ നിലവിലുള്ള നടപടികളില്\u200d നിന്നും മുഴുവന്\u200d മാ പിന്നീട് നമ്മുടെ മോഡലുകളുടെ പരാജയപ്പെട്ട കേസുകള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഈ ജോലിയുടെ പരിധികള്\u200d നമ്മ', 'pl': 'Budowanie chatbotów otwartych domen jest wyzwaniem dla badań nauczania maszynowego. Podczas gdy wcześniejsze prace wykazały, że skalowanie modeli neuronowych pod względem liczby parametrów i wielkości danych, na których są trenowane, daje lepsze wyniki, podkreślamy inne składniki. Dobra konwersacja wymaga mieszanych umiejętności: zapewnienia angażujących punktów rozmowy oraz odpowiedniego wykazywania wiedzy, empatii i osobowości, przy jednoczesnym utrzymaniu spójnej osobowości. Pokazujemy, że modele na dużą skalę mogą nauczyć się tych umiejętności przy podaniu odpowiednich danych szkoleniowych i wyborze strategii generacji. Warianty tych receptur budujemy za pomocą modeli parametrów 90M, 2.7B i 9.4B, a nasze modele i kod udostępniamy publicznie. Oceny ludzkie pokazują, że nasze najlepsze modele przewyższają istniejące podejścia w wielokrotnym dialogu na temat pomiarów zaangażowania i ludzkości. Następnie omówimy ograniczenia tej pracy analizując przypadki awarii naszych modeli.', 'mn': 'Дэлхийн нээлттэй ярилцлага бий болгох нь машин суралцах судалгааны шаардлагатай хэсэг юм. Өмнөх ажил нь мэдрэлийн загварын тоо болон сургалтын мэдээллийн хэмжээг сайжруулсан үр дүн гаргадаг гэдгийг харуулсан ч бид бусад бүтээгдэхүүнийг тодорхойлдог. Сайн ярилцлага нь холбоотой чадвар хэрэгтэй: ярилцлагын цэгүүд, мэдлэг, сэтгэл хандлага, хувьцаа зөвхөн зөвхөн харуулах, зөвхөн тогтвортой хүн байлгаж байдаг. Бид том хэмжээний загварууд эдгээр чадварыг сурах боломжтой багш суралцах өгөгдлийг болон үеийн стратегийг сонгох үед суралцаж чадна. Бид 90M, 2.7B, 9.4B параметр загвартай эдгээр рецептүүдийн өөрчлөлтүүдийг бүтээж, бидний загвар, кодыг нийтэд ашиглаж чадна. Хүн төрөлхтний оюутнууд бидний хамгийн сайн загваруудыг хүн төрөлхтний хэмжээсүүдийн тухай олон өөрчлөгдөлтэй диалог дээр оршиж байгаа арга загварыг харуулдаг. Тэгээд бид энэ ажлын хязгаарлалтыг бидний загварын алдагдлыг шинжилгээр ярилцдаг.', 'no': 'Bygging av open-domain-pratbottar er eit vanskeleg område for maskinelæring. Mens det førre arbeidet har vist at skalering av neuralmodeller i antall parametra og storleiken på data dei trengte på gjev forbetra resultat, markerer vi andre ingredientar. Godt samtale krev blandete ferdighetar: å gje samtalepunkt med samtale, og vise kunnskap, empatikk og personalitet nødvendig, medan du held ei konsistent persone. Vi viser at store skalaemodeller kan lære desse ferdighetene når det gjev passande treningsdata og valet av genereringsstrategi. Vi bygger variantane av desse oppskriftene med 90M, 2,7B og 9,4B-parametrar, og gjer våre modeller og kode offentlig tilgjengeleg. Menneske evalueringar viser at våre beste modeller utfører eksisterande tilnærmingar i dialogen for fleirslått på målingar av engasjerte og menneskeheter. Vi diskuterer derfor grensene for denne arbeiden ved å analysere feiltilfeller i modelane våre.', 'ro': 'Construirea de chatbots cu domeniu deschis este o zonă provocatoare pentru cercetarea de învățare automată. Deși lucrările anterioare au arătat că scalarea modelelor neurale în numărul de parametri și dimensiunea datelor pe care sunt instruite oferă rezultate îmbunătățite, evidențiem alte ingrediente. Conversația bună necesită abilități amestecate: furnizarea de puncte de vorbire captivante și afișarea corespunzătoare a cunoștințelor, empatiei și personalității, menținând în același timp o persoană consistentă. Aratăm că modelele la scară largă pot învăța aceste abilități atunci când primesc date adecvate de formare și alegere a strategiei de generație. Construim variante ale acestor rețete cu modele de parametri 90M, 2.7B și 9.4B și punem modelele și codul nostru la dispoziția publicului. Evaluările umane arată că cele mai bune modele ale noastre depășesc abordările existente în cadrul dialogului în mai multe rânduri privind măsurătorile de implicare și umanitate. Apoi discutăm limitările acestei lucrări analizând cazurile de eșec ale modelelor noastre.', 'sr': 'Izgradnja otvorenih domena je izazovna oblast za istraživanje mašine. Iako je raniji rad pokazao da skaliranje neuronskih modela u broju parametara i veličine podataka na kojima su obučeni pruža poboljšane rezultate, podstažujemo druge sastojke. Dobar razgovor zahteva kombinirane vještine: pružanje uključenih tačka razgovora i prikladno pokazivanje znanja, empatije i ličnosti, dok održavanje konsekventne osobe. Pokazujemo da veliki modeli mogu naučiti te vještine kada se daju odgovarajući podaci obuke i izbor strategije generacije. Mi gradimo variante tih recepta sa modelima parametara 90M, 2,7B i 9,4B, i javno dostavljamo naše modele i kodove. Ljudske procjene pokazuju da naši najbolji modeli iznose postojeće pristupe u multiokrenom dijalogu o mjerama zaposlenosti i humanosti. Onda razgovaramo o ograničenjima ovog rada analiziranjem slučajeva neuspjeha našeg modela.', 'si': 'විවෘත කොටස් බෝට්ස් නිර්මාණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි මැෂින් ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. මුලින් වැඩේ පෙන්වන්නේ න්\u200dයූරාල් මොඩේල් ස්කල් කරන්න පුළුවන් විදියට පරාමිති සංඛ්යාවක් සහ ඔවුන් ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තිය හොඳ සංවාදයක් අවශ්\u200dයයි, සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට අවශ්\u200dයයි: කතා කරන්න ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් දෙන්න, දන්නවත්, සම අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පුළුවන් මේ කුළුවන්ව ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200d අපි 90M, 2.7B සහ 9.4B පැරැමිටර් මෝඩේල් එක්ක මේ රිසිපිට් වර්ගයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, අපේ මෝඩේල් සහ කෝඩ් සාමාන්\u200dය ව මිනිස්සු විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ හොඳම මොඩල් වලින් තියෙන්නේ විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් අවස්ථාවන් වලින්  ඊට පස්සේ අපි මේ වැඩේ සීමාවල් කතා කරනවා අපේ මොඩේල් වල අපරාධ විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්න.', 'so': 'Buildidda jadwalka furan waa goob dhibaato leh oo lagu barto waxbarashada machine. Intii horay shaqadu uu muujiyey in sameynta modelalka neurada ee lambarka parameteriyada iyo tirada macluumaadka lagu baranayo uu siinayo resulto horumarinta ah, waxaynu highlightnaa macluumaad kale. Talo wanaagsan waxaa loo baahan yahay xirfado la xiriiray: la sameynta goobaha hadalka, iyo muujinta aqoonta, xirfadda iyo shakhsiyadda si saxda ah, marka loo haysto qof si siman. Waxaynu tusnaynaa in qaababka waaweyn ay baran karaan aqoontan marka la siiyo takhasusyada waxbarashada saxda ah iyo doorashada strategiyada qarniga. Waxaynu dhisnaa noocyo kala duduwan oo ku qoran 90M, 2.7B iyo 9.4B qaababka parameters, waxaana si bayaan ah u sameynaynaa modeliyada iyo codsigayada. Qiimeynta dadku waxay muujiyaan qaababkayaga ugu wanaagsan ee ku qoran qaabab joogta ah oo ku saabsan qiyaastii biniaadamka. Markaas waxaynu kala sheekeynaa xadida shaqadan si aan u baaritaanno xaalada taageerada modelalkayaga.', 'sv': 'Att bygga chatbots med ﾃｶppen domﾃ､n ﾃ､r ett utmanande omrﾃ･de fﾃｶr maskininlﾃ､rningsforskning. Medan tidigare arbete har visat att skalning av neurala modeller i antalet parametrar och storleken pﾃ･ data de trﾃ､nas pﾃ･ ger fﾃｶrbﾃ､ttrade resultat, lyfter vi fram andra ingredienser. Bra konversation krﾃ､ver blandade fﾃ､rdigheter: att ge engagerande samtalspunkter, visa kunskap, empati och personlighet pﾃ･ lﾃ､mpligt sﾃ､tt, samtidigt som man bibehﾃ･ller en konsekvent person. Vi visar att storskaliga modeller kan lﾃ､ra sig dessa fﾃ､rdigheter nﾃ､r de ges lﾃ､mpliga trﾃ､ningsdata och val av generationsstrategi. Vi bygger varianter av dessa recept med parametermodeller 90M, 2.7B och 9.4B och gﾃｶr vﾃ･ra modeller och koder tillgﾃ､ngliga fﾃｶr allmﾃ､nheten. Mﾃ､nskliga utvﾃ､rderingar visar att vﾃ･ra bﾃ､sta modeller ﾃｶvertrﾃ､ffar befintliga tillvﾃ､gagﾃ･ngssﾃ､tt i flerskiftsdialoger om engagerings- och humanitetsmﾃ､tningar. Vi diskuterar sedan begrﾃ､nsningarna i detta arbete genom att analysera misslyckande fall av vﾃ･ra modeller.', 'ta': 'திறந்த டோமைன் அரட்டை உருவாக்குதல் இயந்திரம் கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் ஒரு சவாலிக்கும் பகுதியாகும். முன் வேலை காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது நல்ல பேச்சு கலப்பு திறமைகள் தேவைப்படுகிறது: பேசும் புள்ளிகளை சேர்த்துக் கொள்வது, அறிவு, உணர்வு, தாழ்வு மற்றும் தனிப்பட்டத்தை சரிய பெரிய அளவு மாதிரிகள் இந்த திறமைகளை கற்றுக் கொள்ள முடியும் என்பதை நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் போது பொருத்தமான 90M, 2.7B மற்றும் 9.4B அளபுரு மாதிரிகளை நாம் உருவாக்குகிறோம் மற்றும் எங்கள் மாதிரிகள் மற்றும் குறியீடு பொதுவாக க கிட மனித சிறந்த மாதிரிகள் இருக்கும் முறையில் இருக்கும் செயல்பாடுகளை வெளிப்படையாக்குகிறது பல திருப்பும் உரையாடலில பின்னர் நாம் இந்த வேலையின் எல்லைகளைப் பற்றி விவாதம் செய்கிறோம் எங்கள் மாதிரிகளின் தோல்வியுற்றங', 'ur': 'کھولتا ہوا ڈومین چاٹبوٹ بنانا ماشین کی تحقیقات کے لئے ایک مشکل منطقه ہے. حالانکہ پہلے کے کام دکھائے گئے ہیں کہ پارامیٹروں کی تعداد میں نیورل موڈل کی اسکیل کرنا اور ان کی تعلیم کی اندازہ بہترین نتیجے دیتے ہیں، ہم دوسرے موجودات کو ہدایت کریں گے۔ اچھی گفتگو کے لئے مختلف کائنات کی ضرورت ہے: مشغول بات کے نقطے، علم، شرمندگی اور شخصیت کو اچھی طرح دکھانے کے لئے، ایک قائم شخص کی حفاظت کے ساتھ. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ بڑے اسکیل موڈل ان کی تعلیمات کو سکھائیں گے جب مناسب تعلیم دادہ اور نسل استراتژی کا انتخاب کیا جاتا ہے۔ ہم ان رسیٹوں کے بدلنے کو 90M, 2.7B اور 9.4B پارامیٹ موڈل کے ساتھ بناتے ہیں اور ہمارے موڈل اور کوڈ کو ظاہر طور پر موجود بناتے ہیں. انسان کی ارزیابیاں ہمارے بہترین موڈل کو دکھاتے ہیں کہ موجود موجودات کے مطابق مطابق اور انسان کی اندازیات کے بارے میں بہت سی طریقے کے مطابق انجام دیتے ہیں. اس کے بعد ہم اس کام کی محدودیت کی بحث کرتے ہیں کہ ہمارے مدل کے شکست کے موقع کو تحقیق کریں۔', 'mt': 'Il-bini ta’ chatbots b’dominju miftuħ huwa qasam ta’ sfida għar-riċerka dwar it-tagħlim tal-magni. Filwaqt li xogħol preċedenti wera li l-iskala tal-mudelli newrali fin-numru ta’ parametri u d-daqs tad-dejta li huma mħarrġa fuqha tagħti riżultati mtejba, aħna ninfasizzaw ingredjenti oħra. Good conversation requires blended skills: providing engaging talking points, and displaying knowledge, empathy and personality appropriately, while maintaining a consistent persona.  Aħna nuru li mudelli fuq skala kbira jistgħu jitgħallmu dawn il-ħiliet meta tingħata dejta xierqa ta’ taħriġ u strateġija ta’ ġenerazzjoni. Aħna nibnu varjanti ta’ dawn ir-riċetti b’mudelli ta’ parametri 90M, 2.7B u 9.4B, u nagħmlu l-mudelli u l-kodiċi tagħna disponibbli għall-pubbliku. L-evalwazzjonijiet tal-bniedem juru li l-aħjar mudelli tagħna jaqbżu l-approċċi eżistenti f’djalogu b’diversi drabi dwar l-involviment u l-kejl tal-umanità. We then discuss the limitations of this work by analyzing failure cases of our models.', 'uz': "Name Birinchi ishni ko'rsatadi, parametrlar soni va o'rganilgan maʼlumotning hajmini ko'paytirish uchun neyural modellarini ko'rsatish mumkin, biz boshqa tarkiblarni ko'ramiz. Bu yaxshi suhbat haqida o'zgaruvchi qo'llanmalar kerak: suhbat holatlarni qo'shish, ta'lim, imkoniyat va shaxsiyatlarni yaxshi ko'rsatish kerak, va bir doim shaxsni davom etish mumkin. Biz ko'rsatganimiz, katta balandlik modellari bu tajriba taʼminlovchi maʼlumot va avval strategiyasini tanlash mumkin. Biz shu takliflar tarkibini 90M, 2.7B va 9.4B parametr modellari bilan yaramiz va modellarimizni va kodlash natijasida mavjud qilamiz. Inson qiymatlari esa bizning eng yaxshi modellarimizni ko'proq turli muloqat muloqat muloqat muloqat muloqat muloqat muloqat muloqat oynasida o'zgartiradi. We then discuss the limitations of this work by analyzing failure cases of our models.", 'vi': 'Xây dựng một khu vực rộng mở, Chatur là một thử thách cho việc nghiên cứu máy móc. Trong khi việc làm trước đã cho thấy việc tăng cường các mô hình thần kinh trong số các tham số và kích thước các dữ liệu được huấn luyện cho hiệu quả tốt hơn, chúng tôi nhấn mạnh các thành phần khác. Đối thoại tốt cần kĩ năng hòa hợp: cung cấp các điểm nói chuyện hấp dẫn, và hiển thị kiến thức, cảm thông và cá nhân một cách thích hợp, đồng thời giữ một cá tính. Chúng tôi cho rằng một cách lớn có thể học được những kỹ năng này khi được cung cấp những thông tin và cách truyền thuyết nhận. Chúng tôi chế tạo các biến của các công thức này bằng mẫu số 9M, 2.7B và 9.4B, và công khai cung cấp các mẫu và mã của chúng tôi. Phân tích con người cho thấy cách tốt nhất của chúng ta là thực hiện các phương pháp có sẵn trong cuộc đối thoại nhiều lần về đo tốc độ. Sau đó chúng ta thảo luận các giới hạn của công việc này bằng cách phân tích các vụ thất bại.', 'nl': 'Het bouwen van open-domein chatbots is een uitdagend gebied voor machine learning onderzoek. Hoewel eerder onderzoek heeft aangetoond dat het schalen van neurale modellen in het aantal parameters en de grootte van de gegevens waarop ze worden getraind verbeterde resultaten oplevert, benadrukken we andere ingrediënten. Goed gesprek vereist gemengde vaardigheden: het bieden van aansprekende gesprekspunten, en het tonen van kennis, empathie en persoonlijkheid op de juiste manier, met behoud van een consistent persona. We laten zien dat grootschalige modellen deze vaardigheden kunnen leren wanneer ze de juiste trainingsdata en de keuze van de generatiestrategie krijgen. We bouwen varianten van deze recepten met 90M, 2.7B en 9.4B parametermodellen, en maken onze modellen en code openbaar beschikbaar. Menselijke evaluaties tonen aan dat onze beste modellen beter presteren dan bestaande benaderingen in multi-turn dialoog over engagingness- en mensheidsmetingen. Vervolgens bespreken we de beperkingen van dit werk door failure cases van onze modellen te analyseren.', 'da': 'Opbygning af chatbots med åbent domæne er et udfordrende område for maskinlæring forskning. Mens tidligere arbejde har vist, at skalering af neurale modeller i antallet af parametre og størrelsen af de data, de er trænet på, giver forbedrede resultater, fremhæver vi andre ingredienser. God samtale kræver blandede færdigheder: at give engagerende talepunkter og vise viden, empati og personlighed korrekt, samtidig med at du bevarer en konsekvent person. Vi viser, at store modeller kan lære disse færdigheder, når de får passende træningsdata og valg af generationsstrategi. Vi bygger varianter af disse opskrifter med 90M, 2.7B og 9.4B parametermodeller, og gør vores modeller og kode offentligt tilgængelige. Menneskelige evalueringer viser, at vores bedste modeller overgår eksisterende tilgange i multi-turn dialog om engagement og menneskelighed målinger. Vi diskuterer derefter begrænsningerne i dette arbejde ved at analysere fejltilfælde af vores modeller.', 'hr': 'Izgradnja otvorenih domena razgovora je izazovna područja za istraživanje strojeva. Iako je prednji rad pokazao da mjerenje neuronskih modela u broju parametara i veličine podataka na kojima su obučeni pružaju poboljšane rezultate, istaknemo druge sastojke. Dobar razgovor zahtijeva kombinirane vještine: pružanje uključenih točka razgovora i prikladno pokazivanje znanja, empatije i osobnosti, dok održavanje konsekvente osobe. Pokazujemo da veliki modeli mogu naučiti te vještine kada daju odgovarajuće podatke o obuci i izbor strategije generacije. Mi gradimo variante tih recepta s modelima parametara 90M, 2,7B i 9,4B, i javno dostavljamo naše modele i kodiranje. Ljudske procjene pokazuju da naši najbolji modeli iznose postojeće pristupe u multiokrenom dijalogu o mjerama učestvosti i humanosti. Onda razgovaramo o ograničenjima ovog rada analiziranjem slučajeva neuspjeha naših modela.', 'bg': 'Изграждането на чат ботове с отворен домейн е предизвикателна област за изследване на машинното обучение. Докато предишна работа показва, че мащабирането на невронните модели в броя на параметрите и размера на данните, върху които са обучени, дава подобрени резултати, ние подчертаваме други съставки. Добрият разговор изисква смесени умения: осигуряване на ангажиращи точки за говорене и показване на знания, съпричастност и личност по подходящ начин, като същевременно поддържа последователна личност. Показваме, че мащабните модели могат да научат тези умения, когато им се предоставят подходящи данни за обучение и избор на стратегия за генериране. Създаваме варианти на тези рецепти с модели 90М, 2.7В и 9.4В параметри и правим нашите модели и кодове публично достъпни. Оценките на хората показват, че нашите най-добри модели превъзхождат съществуващите подходи в диалога на многократни завои за измерване на ангажираността и хуманността. След това обсъждаме ограниченията на тази работа, като анализираме случаите на неуспех на нашите модели.', 'id': 'Membangun chatbot domain terbuka adalah area yang menantang untuk penelitian belajar mesin. Sementara pekerjaan sebelumnya menunjukkan bahwa skala model saraf dalam jumlah parameter dan ukuran data yang mereka pelatih memberikan hasil yang lebih baik, kami mempertimbangkan bahan lain. Percakapan yang baik membutuhkan keterampilan campuran: menyediakan titik berbicara yang menarik, dan menunjukkan pengetahuan, empati dan kepribadian dengan sesuai, sementara mempertahankan kepribadian konsisten. Kami menunjukkan bahwa model skala besar dapat belajar keterampilan ini ketika diberi data latihan yang sesuai dan pilihan strategi generasi. Kami membangun varian resep ini dengan model parameter 90M, 2.7B dan 9.4B, dan membuat model dan kode kami tersedia publik. Evaluasi manusia menunjukkan model terbaik kita melebihi pendekatan yang ada dalam dialog multi-turn tentang ketertarikan dan pengukuran kemanusiaan. We then discuss the limitations of this work by analyzing failure cases of our models.', 'de': 'Der Aufbau von Open-Domain-Chatbots ist ein herausforderndes Gebiet für die maschinelle Lernforschung. Während frühere Arbeiten gezeigt haben, dass die Skalierung neuronaler Modelle in der Anzahl der Parameter und der Größe der Daten, auf denen sie trainiert werden, verbesserte Ergebnisse liefert, heben wir andere Inhaltsstoffe hervor. Gute Konversation erfordert gemischte Fähigkeiten: ansprechende Gesprächspunkte bereitzustellen und Wissen, Empathie und Persönlichkeit angemessen darzustellen, während eine konsistente Persona beibehalten wird. Wir zeigen, dass große Modelle diese Fähigkeiten erlernen können, wenn sie entsprechende Trainingsdaten und die Wahl der Generationsstrategie erhalten. Wir bauen Varianten dieser Rezepte mit 90M, 2.7B und 9.4B Parametermodellen und machen unsere Modelle und Codes öffentlich zugänglich. Humane Auswertungen zeigen, dass unsere besten Modelle bestehende Ansätze im Multi-Turn-Dialog zu Engaging- und Humanitätsmessungen übertreffen. Anschließend diskutieren wir die Grenzen dieser Arbeit, indem wir Fehlerfälle unserer Modelle analysieren.', 'ko': '개방역 채팅 로봇을 구축하는 것은 기계 학습 연구의 도전적인 분야이다.이전의 작업에서 파라미터 수량과 훈련 데이터의 크기에 따라 신경모델을 축소하면 결과를 개선할 수 있다고 밝혔지만 우리는 다른 요소를 강조했다.좋은 대화는 종합적인 기능을 필요로 한다. 사람을 황홀하게 하는 대화 요점을 제공하고 지식, 동조심과 개성을 적절하게 보여주며 일치된 개성을 유지해야 한다.우리는 적당한 훈련 데이터와 생성 전략 선택을 할 때 대형 모델이 이런 기능을 배울 수 있다는 것을 보여준다.우리는 90M, 2.7B, 9.4B 매개 변수 모델로 이 설계도의 변체를 구축하고, 우리의 모델과 코드를 공개한다.인류 평가에 따르면 우리의 가장 좋은 모델은 다륜 대화에서의 흡인력과 인성 측정 방면에서 기존의 방법보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.그리고 우리는 우리 모델의 실패 사례를 분석함으로써 이 업무의 한계성을 토론한다.', 'sw': 'Kujenga mazungumzo ya wazi ya ndani ni eneo la changamoto kwa ajili ya kujifunza mashine. Wakati kazi ya kabla imeonyesha kwamba kupunguza mifano ya neurali katika idadi ya parameter na ukubwa wa data wanazofundishwa inaleta matokeo maboresho, tunaonyesha vifaa vingine. Mazungumzo mazuri yanahitaji ujuzi mzuri: kutoa vituo vya kuzungumza, na kuonyesha maarifa, huruma na utu sahihi, wakati akiendelea kuwa mtu aliyeendelea. Tunaonyesha kuwa mifano makubwa yanaweza kujifunza ujuzi huu wakati wa kutoa taarifa za mafunzo na chaguo la mkakati wa kizazi. Tunajenga mabadiliko ya wapiti hawa kwa mifano 90M, 2.7B na 9.4B, na kutengeneza mifano na kodi yetu kwa uwazi. Tathmini za binadamu zinaonyesha mifano yetu bora zaidi inayoonyesha mbinu zilizopo katika mazungumzo ya majadiliano mengi ya kujiunga na upasuaji wa binadamu. Kisha tunajadili vizuizi vya kazi hii kwa kuchambua matukio ya kushindwa kwa mifano yetu.', 'fa': 'ساختن صحبت های دامنی باز برای تحقیقات یادگیری ماشین یک منطقه سخت است. در حالی که کارهای قبلی نشان داده است که مقیاس مدل عصبی در تعداد پارامتر و اندازه داده های آموزش داده شده\u200cاند، نتایج بهتری را می\u200cدهد، ما مواد دیگری را تسبیح می\u200cدهیم. مکالمه خوب نیاز به مهارت متصل است: موافقت کردن نقطه\u200cهای صحبت و نمایش دانش، همدلی و شخصیت به طور مناسب، در حالی که حفظ یک شخص متصل است. ما نشان می دهیم که مدلهای مقیاس بزرگ می توانند این مهارت را یاد بگیرند وقتی داده های آموزش مناسب و انتخاب استراتژی نسل داده می شود. ما variants of these recipes are built with 90M, 2.7B and 9.4B parameter models, and make our models and code publicly available. ارزیابی انسان بهترین مدل\u200cهای ما را نشان می\u200cدهد که در محاوره\u200cهای بسیاری از طریق\u200cهایی که موجود هستند در محاوره\u200cای که در مورد اندازه\u200cهای پرداختگی و انسانی است انجام می\u200cدهند. سپس در مورد محدودیت این کار با تحلیل پرونده\u200cهای شکست مدل\u200cهای ما بحث می\u200cکنیم.', 'tr': 'Aç-domani sohbatlar inşa etmek maşyny öwrenmek üçin kynçylyk bölegidir. Öňki işiň görkezilişinde näyral modelleriň ölçüsi parametrolaryň sanynda we okuwçylanan verileriň ölçüsi gelişmiş netijeleri bardyr diýip görkezilişinde, başga zatlary ýagtylaşdyrýarys. Gowy çykyş karmaşdyrylyk ukyplary gerek: gepleşme noktalaryny saýlamak, bilgi, empatiýa we kişiliýeti dogry bir adam goramak üçin gerek. Biz uly ölçekli nusgalaryň bu ukyplary nähili gerekli okuwçy maglumatlary we jenaýatyň strategiýasy berilýän wagtynda öwrenip biljekdigini görkezip bilýäris. Bu receplerin 90M, 2.7B we 9.4B parametr modelleri we modellerimizi halkara ulaştyrýarys. İnsanlar değerlendirmeleri bizim en iyi modellerimizi çok çarpıcı ve insanlık ölçülerinde bulunan yaklaşmalarımızı gösteriyor. Sonra bu işiň hatlaryny nusgalarymyzyň hassalaryny çözerek çözülýäris.', 'af': "Op die bou van open-domein-geselskote is 'n pragtige area vir masjien leer ondersoek. Terwyl voorheede werk vertoon het dat skalering neurale modele in die aantal parameters en die grootte van die data wat hulle opgelei word op gee verbeterde resultate, ons verlig ander ingredients. Goeie gesprek benodig gemaakte kunstenaars: verskaf die samekomstige praatspunte en vertoon kennis, empatie en persoonlike toepassing, terwyl 'n bestaande persoon behou. Ons wys dat groot skaal modelles hierdie kunstenaars kan leer wanneer gegee het geskikte onderwerp data en keuse van generasie strategie. Ons bou variante van hierdie recepte met 90M, 2.7B en 9.4B parameter modele en maak ons modele en kode openlik beskikbaar. Die menslike evaluasies vertoon ons beste modele wat bestaande toegange in multi-draai dialoog uitvoer op die samelewing en menslike meetings. Ons bespreek dan die beperkinge van hierdie werk deur die analyseer van mislukking gevalle van ons modele.", 'sq': 'Ndërtimi i chatbotëve me domini të hapur është një fushë sfiduese për kërkimet e mësimit të makinave. Ndërsa puna e mëparshme ka treguar se rritja e modeleve nervore në numrin e parametrave dhe madhësia e të dhënave që janë trajnuar jep rezultate të përmirësuara, ne theksojmë përbërësit e tjera. Biseda e mirë kërkon aftësi të përziera: sigurimin e pikave të folura të përfshira dhe shfaqjen e njohurive, empatisë dhe personalitetit në mënyrë të përshtatshme, duke mbajtur një person konsistent. Ne tregojmë se modelet në shkallë të madhe mund të mësojnë këto aftësi kur u jepen të dhëna të përshtatshme trainimi dhe zgjedhje e strategjisë së gjeneratës. Ne ndërtojmë variante të këtyre recetave me modele të parametrave 90M, 2.7B dhe 9.4B, dhe i bëjmë modelet dhe kodet tona të disponueshëm publikisht. Human evaluations show our best models outperform existing approaches in multi-turn dialogue on engagingness and humanness measurements.  Pastaj diskutojmë kufizimet e kësaj pune duke analizuar rastet e dështimit të modeleve tona.', 'am': 'የዶሜን ክፍት ሀገር መሠረት የመኪና ትምህርት ትምህርት መግለጫ ነው፡፡ የቀድሞው ስራ የናቡር ሞዴላዎች በparameters ቁጥር እና የተማሩት የዳታ ቁጥር ፍሬዎችን ያበጅላቸዋል፡፡ መልካም ንግግር የነጥብ ብልሃት ያስፈልጋል፤ የንግግር ቦታዎች እና እውቀትን ማሳየት፣ ስህተት እና የራሳቸውን ግንኙነት በመስጠት እና አስተያየት በመስጠት እና በተጨማሪነት ማሳየት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ትልቅ ስፋት ምሳሌዎች እነዚህን እውቀት ማወቅ የሚችሉትን የፍጥረት ዳታ እና የትውልድ strategy ሲሰጡ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ እነዚህን ሰርቨሮች በ90M፣ 2.7B እና 9.4B አካላት እናደርጋለን እና ሞዴሎችንን እና ኮድ በሙሉ እናገልጣለን፡፡ የሰው ምርጫዎች የአካባቢነት እና የሰብዓዊ ስብሰባ በማድረግ የሚኖረውን የአካባቢ ደረጃዎችን የሚያሳዩ ናቸው፡፡ በኋላም የዚህን ሥራ ግንኙነታችንን የስህተት ጉዳዮች በማስተያየት እናወራለን፡፡', 'hy': "Բաց բնագավառ շտաբոտների կառուցվածքը մեքենային ուսումնասիրության մարտահրավեր է: While prior work has shown that scaling neural models in the number of parameters and the size of the data they are trained on gives improved results, we highlight other ingredients.  Լավ խոսակցությունը պահանջում է խառնված հմտություններ' ներգրավող խոսակցության կետեր տրամադրելու և գիտելիքների, կարեկցանքի և անհատականության ճիշտ ցույց տալու, միաժամանակ պահպանելով համապատասխան անհատականությունը: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեծ մասշտաբով մոդելները կարող են սովորել այդ հմտությունները, երբ տրվում են համապատասխան ուսուցման տվյալներ և սերնդի ռազմավարության ընտրություն: Մենք կառուցում ենք այս բաղադրատոմսերի տարբերակները 90M, 2.7B և 9.4B պարամետրերի մոդելներով, և հանրային հասանելի դարձնում ենք մեր մոդելները և կոդը: Մարդկային գնահատումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր լավագույն մոդելները գերազանցում են գոյություն ունեցող մոտեցումներին բազմահատվածային հաղորդակցման մեջ ներգրավվածության և մարդկության չափումների մասին: Այնուհետև մենք քննարկում ենք այս աշխատանքի սահմանափակումները վերլուծում ենք մեր մոդելների ձախողումների դեպքերը:", 'bn': 'Building open-domain chatbots is a challenging area for machine learning research.  পূর্বের কাজ দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্যারামিটারের সংখ্যা এবং তথ্যের আকারে তাদের প্রশিক্ষিত হয়েছে তারা উন্নত ফলাফল দিয়েছে, আমরা অন্যান্য উপাদা ভাল কথোপকথনের ক্ষেত্রে ভালো দক্ষতা প্রয়োজন: কথোপকথন বিন্দুর সাথে যোগাযোগ করা এবং জ্ঞান, সহানুভূতি এবং ব্যক্তিগত প্রদর্শনের প্রয়ো আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে বিশাল স্ক্যাল মডেল এই দক্ষতা শিখতে পারে যথাযথ প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য এবং প্রজন্মের কৌশলের ব আমরা ৯০ মিটার, ২. ৭বি এবং ৯. ৪বি প্যারামার মডেল নির্মাণ করি এবং আমাদের মডেল এবং কোড প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যায়। মানুষের মূল্য দেখা যাচ্ছে আমাদের সেরা মডেল প্রদর্শন করা যাচ্ছে বিদ্যমান প্রতিক্রিয়া এবং মানবিক পরিমাপের বিষয়বস্ত তারপর আমরা আমাদের মডেলের ব্যর্থতা বিশ্লেষণের মাধ্যমে এই কাজের সীমা নিয়ে আলোচনা করি।', 'bs': 'Izgradnja otvorenih domena je izazovna oblast za istraživanje strojeva. Iako je prednji rad pokazao da skaliranje neuronskih modela u broju parametara i veličine podataka na kojima su obučeni pruža poboljšane rezultate, podsjećamo druge sastojke. Dobar razgovor zahtijeva spojene vještine: pružanje uključenih tačka razgovora i prikladno pokazivanje znanja, empatije i ličnosti, dok održavanje konsekventne osobe. Pokazujemo da veliki modeli mogu naučiti te vještine kada su dobili odgovarajuće podatke o obuci i izbor strategije generacije. Mi gradimo variante tih recepta sa modelima parametara 90M, 2.7B i 9.4B, i javno dostavljamo naše modele i kodove. Ljudske procjene pokazuju da naši najbolji modeli iznose postojeće pristupe u multiokrenom dijalogu o mjerenju zaposlenosti i humanosti. Onda razgovaramo o ograničenjima ovog rada analiziranjem slučajeva neuspjeha našeg modela.', 'ca': "Construir chatbots de domini obert és una àrea difícil per a la recerca d'aprenentatge automàtic. Mentre que la feina anterior ha demostrat que l'escala dels models neuronals en el nombre de paràmetres i la mida de les dades en les que estan entrenats dóna millors resultats, destaquem altres ingredients. La bona conversa requereix habilitats combinades: proporcionar punts de parla interessants, i mostrar coneixements, empatia i personalitat apropiadament, mantenint una persona constante. Mostrem que els models a gran escala poden aprendre aquestes habilitats quan se'ls donen dades adequades de formació i tria estratègia de generació. Construim variants d'aquestes recetes amb models de paràmetres 90M, 2.7B i 9.4B, i fem públics els nostres models i codi. Les evaluacions humanes mostren que els nostres millors models superen els enfocaments existents en diàleg múltiple sobre la participació i les medicions de l'humanitat. Després discutem les limitacions d'aquesta feina analitzant casos de fracàs dels nostres models.", 'az': 'Açıq-domani çənələri inşa etmək maşın öyrənməsi üçün çətin bir alandır. Əvvəlki işdə nöral modellərin ölçülərinin sayı və təhsil edildikləri verilən məlumatların böyüklüyünü daha yaxşılaşdırmağını göstərdiyi halda, başqa məlumatları işıqlandırırıq. Yaxşı danışmaq müxtəlif yetkinlik lazımdır: danışmaq məqsədilə danışmaq, bilgi göstərmək, empatika və kişilik düzgün olmaq, müəyyən bir kişiyi qorumaq üçün. Biz böyük ölçü modellərin bu yeteneklikləri münasibətli təhsil məlumatlarını və nəticə stratejisini seçdikdə öyrənə biləcəyini göstəririk. Biz bu receptlərin variablarını 90M, 2.7B və 9.4B parametrlərin modelləri ilə inşa edirik və modellərimizi və kodumuzu açıq-aşkar mövcuddur. İnsan değerlendirmələri bizim ən yaxşı modellərimizi çoxlu dönüş diyalələrində çoxlu tərəflər və insanlıq ölçüləri barəsində müəyyən edilən tərəfləri göstərər. Sonra modellərimizin başarısızlıq məsələlərini analizi edərək bu işin sınırlarını danışırıq.', 'cs': 'Vytváření chatbotů s otevřenou doménou je náročnou oblastí pro výzkum strojového učení. Zatímco předchozí práce ukázaly, že škálování neuronových modelů v počtu parametrů a velikosti dat, na kterých jsou trénovány, poskytuje lepší výsledky, upozorňujeme na další složky. Dobrá konverzace vyžaduje smíšené dovednosti: poskytování poutavých diskusních bodů a vhodné zobrazení znalostí, empatie a osobnosti při zachování konzistentní osobnosti. Ukazujeme, že rozsáhlé modely se tyto dovednosti mohou naučit, pokud jsou k dispozici vhodné tréninkové údaje a výběr generační strategie. Varianty těchto receptů stavíme s parametrovými modely 90M, 2.7B a 9.4B a zpřístupníme naše modely a kód veřejně. Lidská hodnocení ukazují, že naše nejlepší modely překonávají stávající přístupy v multi-turn dialogu o měření angažovanosti a lidskosti. Následně diskutujeme omezení této práce analýzou případů selhání našich modelů.', 'fi': 'Avoimen verkkotunnuksen chatbottien rakentaminen on haastava alue koneoppimisen tutkimukselle. Aiemmat tutkimukset ovat osoittaneet, että neuromallien skaalaaminen parametrien lukumäärässä ja niiden kouluttaman datan koossa antaa parempia tuloksia, mutta korostamme muita ainesosia. Hyvä keskustelu edellyttää yhdistettyjä taitoja: sitovien puhepisteiden tarjoamista ja tiedon, empatian ja persoonallisuuden osoittamista asianmukaisesti säilyttäen samalla johdonmukaisen persoonan. Osoitamme, että laajamittaiset mallit voivat oppia nämä taidot, kun heille annetaan asianmukaiset koulutustiedot ja sukupolvistrategian valinta. Rakennamme näistä resepteistä muunnelmia 90M, 2.7B ja 9.4B parametrimalleilla ja teemme mallit ja koodimme julkisesti saataville. Ihmisten arvioinnit osoittavat, että parhaat mallit ylittävät nykyiset lähestymistapamme sitoutumisen ja inhimillisyyden mittaamisen monimutkaisessa vuoropuhelussa. Tämän jälkeen keskustelemme tämän työn rajoituksista analysoimalla malliemme epäonnistumistapauksia.', 'et': 'Avatud domeeni chatbotide ehitamine on masinõppe uuringute jaoks keeruline valdkond. Kuigi varasem töö on näidanud, et närvimudelite skaleerimine parameetrite arvu ja andmete suuruse osas, millele nad on koolitatud, annab paremaid tulemusi, toome esile teisi koostisosi. Hea vestlus nõuab kombineeritud oskusi: pakkuda kaasahaaravaid vestluspunkte ning näidata asjakohaselt teadmisi, empaatiat ja isiksust, säilitades samas järjepideva isiksuse. Näitame, et suuremahulised mudelid saavad neid oskusi õppida, kui neile antakse sobivad koolitusandmed ja põlvkonnastrateegia valik. Me ehitame nende retseptide variandid 90M, 2.7B ja 9.4B parameetrimudelitega ning teeme oma mudelid ja koodi avalikult kättesaadavaks. Inimeste hinnangud näitavad, et meie parimad mudelid ületavad olemasolevaid lähenemisviise mitme pöörde dialoogis kaasatuse ja inimlikkuse mõõtmise üle. Seejärel arutame selle töö piiranguid, analüüsides oma mudelite ebaõnnestumisjuhtumeid.', 'jv': 'Binding open-domain chantbot is a changelnging region for device Learning Genjer-Genjer diunting langgar Awak dhéwé sing takon ngerasakno karo perbudhakan sing apik: nggawe ngubah werak nggawe sapa-berkas, empati lan persilan-perbudhakan, iso nguasai perbudhakan sampeyan sapa-sampeyan. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing larang sampek akeh lan alat-sampek kuwi nggawe gerakan sampek data sing berarti ngono nggawe sistem sing apik dhéwé. @alaletextattr Ngucap Cino Awak dhéwé pisan dérané perusahaan kanggo nggawe gerakan kanggo bisa ranjelasi gadoh sing gawe model.', 'he': 'בניית שיטבוטים בתחום פתוח היא אזור מאתגר למחקר ללמוד מכונות. בעוד העבודה הקודמת הראה שגודל הדוגמנים העצביים במספר הפרמטרים ובגודל המידע שהם מאומנים עליו נותן תוצאות משתפרות, אנחנו מזכירים מרכיבים אחרים. שיחה טובה דורשת כישורים מעורבים: לספק נקודות דיבורים מעורבות, ולהציג ידע, אמפתיה ואישיות בהתאם, בזמן לשמור על איש קבוע. אנחנו מראים שדוגמנים בקנה מידה גדולה יכולים ללמוד את הכישורים האלה כשנותנים נתונים אימונים מתאימים ובחירת אסטרטגיה לדור. אנו בונים שונים של המתכונים האלה עם דוגמנים של פרמטרים 90M, 2.7B ו-9.4B, ולהפוך את הדוגמנים והקוד שלנו פנויים לציבור. הערכות האנושיות מראות שהדוגמנים הטובים ביותר שלנו עולים על גישות קיימות בדיולוג במספר פעמים על התעסקות ומדידות האנושות. ואז נדון על הגבלות של העבודה הזאת על ידי ניתוח מקרים כישלון של הדוגמנים שלנו.', 'sk': 'Gradnja chatbotov z odprto domeno je zahtevno področje za raziskave strojnega učenja. Medtem ko je predhodno delo pokazalo, da povečanje števila parametrov in velikosti podatkov, na katerih so usposobljeni, daje izboljšane rezultate, poudarjamo druge sestavine. Dober pogovor zahteva mešane veščine: zagotavljanje privlačnih govornih točk ter ustrezno prikazovanje znanja, empatije in osebnosti, hkrati pa ohranjanje dosledne osebnosti. Pokazujemo, da se lahko modeli obsežnega obsega naučijo teh veščin, če jim dobimo ustrezne podatke o usposabljanju in izbiro strategije generacije. Različice teh receptov gradimo z modeli parametrov 90M, 2.7B in 9.4B ter omogočamo javno dostopnost naših modelov in kod. Ocene ljudi kažejo, da naši najboljši modeli presegajo obstoječe pristope v dialogu z več obrati o merjenju vključenosti in človeštva. Nato razpravljamo o omejitvah tega dela z analizo primerov neuspeha naših modelov.', 'ha': "Buning chatbots masu buɗe-Domen yana da zanen zartar da shirin karatun mashinaki. Aka gaba ga aikin ya nuna cewa motsi masu neural cikin ƙidãn parameteri da girmar data da aka sanar da su, yana ƙara matsalan da aka kyautata, kuma za mu ƙayyade wasu ingoyi. Babu mazaɓa mai kyau yana da kunnuwa masu saɓa: ka sami da pointi masu faɗa, kuma ka nuna kunyar, umarni da mutane da daidai, da kuma ka tsare mutane wanda ke daidai. Tuna nũna cewa misalin masu girma za'a iya sanar da waɗannan abinci idan an bã da data masu amfani da kuma zaɓi tsarin kizafi. Muna samar da wasu masu motsi na waɗannan da ke samar da misãlai 90M, 2.7B da 9.4B, kuma muna samar da misãlai da kodi da bayyane. Ana ƙaddara mutum yana nũna masu kyaun misãlai da ke samar da kowanmu masu cikin zauren akwatin bayani na dabam-dabar-dabam kan taƙaitacce da haske ga mutane. We then discuss the limitations of this work by analyzing failure cases of our models.", 'bo': 'Building open-domain chatbots is a challenging area for machine learning research. While prior work has shown that scaling neural models in the number of parameters and the size of the data they are trained on gives improved results, we highlight other ingredients. གཏམ་གླེང་སྐྱོན་ལ་ཁྱད་པར་སྤྲོད་ཅན་གྱི་ནུས་པ་དགོས་མཁན་ཡོད། སྐད་བཤད་ནི་དང་ཤེས་ཡོད་པ་དང་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ཞིག ང་ཚོས་མི་དབྱིབས་ཚད་ཆེ་བ་དག་གི་ཁྱད་པར་སྟོན་གྱིས་ན་གྲུབ་རྩོལ་བ་འདི་དག་སྟོན་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། We build variants of these recipes with 90M, 2.7B and 9.4B parameter models, and make our models and code publicly available. Human evaluations show our best models perform existing approaches in multi-turn dialog on engaging and humanism measurements. འོན་ཀྱང་ང་ཚོས་མི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་གྱི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་བྱ་ཚིག་ལས་ཉེན་ཁ་ཚད་འདིའི་གྲངས་བསྐོར་བྱས་ནས་'}
{'en': 'Evaluating the Evaluation of Diversity in Natural Language Generation', 'ar': 'تقييم تقييم التنوع في توليد اللغة الطبيعية', 'fr': "Évaluation de l'évaluation de la diversité dans la génération du langage naturel", 'es': 'Evaluación de la evaluación de la diversidad en la generación del lenguaje natural', 'pt': 'Avaliando a Avaliação da Diversidade na Geração de Linguagem Natural', 'zh': '评估自然语言生多样性之评估', 'ja': '自然言語生成における多様性の評価', 'ru': 'Оценка разнообразия в генерации естественного языка', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक भाषा पीढ़ी में विविधता के मूल्यांकन का मूल्यांकन', 'ga': 'Measúnú ar an Éagsúlacht i nGiniúint Teanga Nádúrtha', 'hu': 'A sokszínűség értékelése a természetes nyelv generálásában', 'ka': 'განსხვავების განსაზღვრებას თავისუფალური ენის განვითარება', 'el': 'Αξιολόγηση της Αξιολόγησης της Ποικιλομορφίας στη Δημιουργία Φυσικής Γλώσσας', 'it': 'Valutazione della diversità nella generazione del linguaggio naturale', 'lt': 'Gamtinės kalbos įvairovės vertinimas', 'mk': 'Оценувањето на проценката на различноста во генерацијата на природен јазик', 'ms': 'Menghargai Penghargaan Keberagaman dalam Jenerasi Bahasa Alami', 'mt': 'Evalwazzjoni tal-Evalwazzjoni tad-Diversità fil-Ġenerazzjoni tal-Lingwi Naturali', 'ml': 'Evaluating the Evaluation of Diversity in Natural Language Generation', 'pl': 'Ocena oceny różnorodności w generowaniu języka naturalnego', 'kk': 'Табиғи тілдерді құру үшін айырмашылығының оқу', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл төрөлхтний өөрчлөлтийн үнэлгээг', 'no': 'Evaluering av ulikheten i naturspråk', 'ro': 'Evaluarea evaluării diversității în generarea limbajului natural', 'so': 'Qiimeynta ku saabsan muuqashada luuqada asalka', 'si': 'ස්වභාවික භාෂාව සංපත්තියෙන් විශේෂණය ගැන විශ්වාස කරන්න', 'sv': 'Utvärdering av mångfald i naturspråksgenerering', 'ta': 'Evaluating the Evaluation of Diversity in Natural Language Generation', 'sr': 'Evaluacija raznolikosti u generaciji prirodnog jezika', 'ur': 'طبیعی زبان کی نسل میں مختلفیت کی ارزش کا ارزش کرنا ہے', 'vi': 'Đánh giá sự đánh giá khác biệt trong tạo ngôn ngữ tự nhiên', 'uz': 'Natalik tilni yaratishda raqamli tasdiqlash', 'bg': 'Оценка на оценката на многообразието при генерирането на естествен език', 'nl': 'Evaluatie van de Evaluatie van Diversiteit in het Genereren van Natuurlijke Taal', 'da': 'Evaluering af evaluering af mangfoldighed i generering af natursprog', 'hr': 'Procjenjivanje procjene raznolikosti u generaciji prirodnog jezika', 'ko': '자연 언어 생성에서의 다양성 평가', 'de': 'Bewertung der Diversität in der Generierung natürlicher Sprache', 'id': 'Mengevaluasi Evaluasi Keberagaman dalam Generasi Bahasa Alami', 'af': 'Evalueer die Evaluering van Diversiteit in Natuurlike Taal Generasie', 'tr': 'Tibiýal dil döredilişinde Çeşitliklerin Taýýarlamasyny çykýar', 'fa': 'ارزیابی ارزیابی مختلف در نسل زبان طبیعی', 'sw': 'Kutathmini Uthibitisho wa tofauti katika Uzalishaji wa lugha ya asili', 'sq': 'Vlerësimi i vlerësimit të diversitetit në gjenerimin e gjuhës natyrore', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'az': '쥔抙쥩璙楬䐠汩䴠駉汸煵瑡뇄쑮溱쌠文鿅瑩쥭玙湩湩儠뇄浹瑥੩', 'bs': 'Procjenjivanje procjene raznolikosti u generaciji prirodnog jezika', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রজন্মের বৈচিত্র্যের মূল্যায়ন করা হচ্ছে', 'et': 'Looduskeele genereerimise mitmekesisuse hindamise hindamine', 'cs': 'Hodnocení rozmanitosti v generování přirozeného jazyka', 'fi': 'Luonnollisen kielen monimuotoisuuden arvioinnin arviointi', 'ca': "Evaluant l'Evaluation of Diversity in Natural Language Generation", 'hy': 'Evaluating the Evaluation of Diversity in Natural Language Generation', 'jv': 'Deweke Kapen Tarjamahan kanggo Kebebasan Panjenengan Sesi Daerah', 'he': 'הערכה של הערכה של ההרבות ביצירת שפות טבעיות', 'sk': 'Ocena vrednotenja raznolikosti pri ustvarjanju naravnega jezika', 'ha': 'Ana ƙayyade Bambanci na Diversity in Taural', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་གི་སྐད་རིགས་གསར་བསྐྲུན་ནང་གི་དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་evaluation (Evaluation of Diversity)'}
{'en': 'Despite growing interest in natural language generation (NLG) models that produce diverse outputs, there is currently no principled method for evaluating the diversity of an NLG system. In this work, we propose a framework for evaluating diversity metrics. The framework measures the correlation between a proposed diversity metric and a diversity parameter, a single parameter that controls some aspect of diversity in generated text. For example, a diversity parameter might be a binary variable used to instruct crowdsourcing workers to generate text with either low or high content diversity. We demonstrate the utility of our framework by : (a) establishing best practices for eliciting diversity judgments from humans, (b) showing that humans substantially outperform automatic metrics in estimating content diversity, and (c) demonstrating that existing methods for controlling diversity by tuning a decoding parameter mostly affect form but not meaning. Our framework can advance the understanding of different diversity metrics, an essential step on the road towards better NLG systems.metrics. The framework measures the correlation between a proposed diversity metric and a diversity parameter, a single parameter that controls some aspect of diversity in generated text. For example, a diversity parameter might be a binary variable used to instruct crowdsourcing workers to generate text with either low or high content diversity. We demonstrate the utility of our framework by: (a) establishing best practices for eliciting diversity judgments from humans, (b) showing that humans substantially outperform automatic metrics in estimating content diversity, and (c) demonstrating that existing methods for controlling diversity by tuning a “decoding parameter” mostly affect form but not meaning. Our framework can advance the understanding of different diversity metrics, an essential step on the road towards better NLG systems.', 'fr': "Malgré l'intérêt croissant pour les modèles de génération de langage naturel (GNL) qui produisent des extrants divers, il n'existe actuellement aucune méthode fondée sur des principes pour évaluer la diversité d'un système de GNL. Dans ce travail, nous proposons un cadre d'évaluation des métriques de diversité. Le cadre mesure la corrélation entre une métrique de diversité proposée et un paramètre de diversité, un paramètre unique qui contrôle certains aspects de la diversité dans le texte généré. Par exemple, un paramètre de diversité peut être une variable binaire utilisée pour demander aux travailleurs du crowdsourcing de générer du texte avec une diversité de contenu faible ou élevée. Nous démontrons l'utilité de notre cadre en\xa0: (a) établissant les meilleures pratiques pour obtenir des jugements de diversité de la part des humains, (b) montrant que les humains surpassent considérablement les métriques automatiques dans l'estimation de la diversité du contenu, et (c) démontrant que les méthodes existantes de contrôle de la diversité en ajustant a\xa0» paramètre de décodage\xa0» affecte principalement la forme mais pas la signification. Notre cadre peut faire progresser la compréhension des différentes mesures de diversité, une étape essentielle sur la voie de meilleurs systèmes de GNL.", 'ar': 'على الرغم من الاهتمام المتزايد بنماذج توليد اللغة الطبيعية (NLG) التي تنتج مخرجات متنوعة ، لا توجد حاليًا طريقة مبدئية لتقييم تنوع نظام NLG. في هذا العمل ، نقترح إطار عمل لتقييم مقاييس التنوع. يقيس إطار العمل العلاقة بين مقياس التنوع المقترح ومعلمة التنوع ، وهي معلمة واحدة تتحكم في بعض جوانب التنوع في النص الذي تم إنشاؤه. على سبيل المثال ، قد تكون معلمة التنوع متغيرًا ثنائيًا يستخدم لتوجيه عمال التعهيد الجماعي لإنشاء نص بتنوع محتوى منخفض أو مرتفع. نبرهن على فائدة إطار عملنا من خلال: (أ) إنشاء أفضل الممارسات لاستنباط أحكام التنوع من البشر ، (ب) إظهار أن البشر يتفوقون بشكل كبير على المقاييس التلقائية في تقدير تنوع المحتوى ، و (ج) إثبات الأساليب الحالية للتحكم في التنوع من خلال الضبط تؤثر "معلمة فك التشفير" في الغالب على الشكل ولكن لا تؤثر في المعنى. يمكن لإطار عملنا أن يعزز فهم مقاييس التنوع المختلفة ، وهي خطوة أساسية على الطريق نحو أنظمة NLG أفضل.', 'pt': 'Apesar do crescente interesse em modelos de geração de linguagem natural (NLG) que produzem diversas saídas, atualmente não existe um método baseado em princípios para avaliar a diversidade de um sistema NLG. Neste trabalho, propomos um framework para avaliação de métricas de diversidade. A estrutura mede a correlação entre uma métrica de diversidade proposta e um parâmetro de diversidade, um único parâmetro que controla algum aspecto da diversidade no texto gerado. Por exemplo, um parâmetro de diversidade pode ser uma variável binária usada para instruir os trabalhadores de crowdsourcing a gerar texto com baixa ou alta diversidade de conteúdo. Demonstramos a utilidade de nossa estrutura: (a) estabelecendo as melhores práticas para obter julgamentos de diversidade de humanos, (b) mostrando que os humanos superam substancialmente as métricas automáticas na estimativa de diversidade de conteúdo e (c) demonstrando que os métodos existentes para controlar a diversidade ajustando um “parâmetro de decodificação” afeta principalmente a forma, mas não o significado. Nossa estrutura pode avançar na compreensão de diferentes métricas de diversidade, um passo essencial no caminho para melhores sistemas NLG.', 'es': 'A pesar del creciente interés en los modelos de generación de lenguaje natural (NLG) que producen resultados diversos, actualmente no hay un método basado en principios para evaluar la diversidad de un sistema de NLG. En este trabajo, proponemos un marco para evaluar las métricas de diversidad. El marco mide la correlación entre una métrica de diversidad propuesta y un parámetro de diversidad, un único parámetro que controla algún aspecto de la diversidad en el texto generado. Por ejemplo, un parámetro de diversidad podría ser una variable binaria utilizada para instruir a los trabajadores de crowdsourcing a generar texto con una diversidad de contenido baja o alta. Demostramos la utilidad de nuestro marco al: (a) establecer las mejores prácticas para obtener juicios de diversidad por parte de los humanos, (b) demostrar que los humanos superan sustancialmente a las métricas automáticas en la estimación de la diversidad de contenido, y (c) demostramos que los métodos existentes para controlar la diversidad ajustando un» parámetro de decodificación» afecta principalmente a la forma pero no al significado. Nuestro marco puede mejorar la comprensión de las diferentes métricas de diversidad, un paso esencial en el camino hacia mejores sistemas de NLG.', 'zh': '虽人生异自然语言(NLG)形益感,未有原则性以质NLG统之多样性。 于此,论多样性指标之框架。 其框架量议者多样性指标与多样性参数之间相关性,多样性参数制生成文本多样性其一参数也。 如多样性参数或一二进制变量,指示众包工作人员生卑高多样性文本。 吾以下效吾框架:(a)立至行,以发人之多样性,(b)明人之度数多样性大优自指标,及(c)证以调解码参数以制多样性,非义也。 吾框架可以促多样性指标解,此迈向善NLG之要也。', 'ja': '多様なアウトプットを生み出す自然言語生成（ NLG ）モデルへの関心が高まっているにもかかわらず、NLGシステムの多様性を評価するための原理的な方法は現在存在しない。 この研究では、多様性指標を評価するためのフレームワークを提案します。 フレームワークは、提案された多様性指標と、生成されたテキスト内の多様性のいくつかの側面を制御する単一のパラメータである多様性パラメータとの間の相関を測定します。 たとえば、多様性パラメータは、低または高コンテンツ多様性のいずれかでテキストを生成するようにクラウドソーシングワーカーに指示するために使用されるバイナリ変数であり得る。 私たちは、(a)人間から多様性の判断を引き出すためのベストプラクティスを確立すること、(b)コンテンツの多様性を推定する際に人間が自動指標を実質的に上回ることを示すこと、および(c)「デコードパラメータ」を調整することによって多様性を制御するための既存の方法がほとんどの場合、形式に影響を与えるが意味には影響を及ぼさないことを示すことによって、私たちのフレームワークの有用性を実証します。 当社のフレームワークは、さまざまな多様性指標の理解を進めることができます。これは、より良いNLGシステムへの道のりの重要なステップです。', 'ru': 'Несмотря на растущий интерес к моделям генерации естественного языка (NLG), которые производят разнообразные результаты, в настоящее время нет принципиального метода оценки разнообразия системы NLG. В этой работе мы предлагаем структуру для оценки показателей разнообразия. Эта система измеряет корреляцию между предлагаемой метрикой разнообразия и параметром разнообразия - одним параметром, который контролирует определенный аспект разнообразия в сгенерированном тексте. Например, параметр разнообразия может быть двоичной переменной, используемой для обучения сотрудников краудсорсинга генерировать текст с низким или высоким содержанием разнообразия. Мы демонстрируем полезность нашей структуры, а именно: (а) устанавливаем лучшие практики для получения суждений о разнообразии от людей, (б) показываем, что люди значительно превосходят автоматические метрики в оценке разнообразия контента, и (в) демонстрируем, что существующие методы управления разнообразием путем настройки «параметра декодирования» в основном влияют на форму, но не значение. Наша структура может способствовать более глубокому пониманию различных показателей разнообразия, что является важным шагом на пути к улучшению систем NLG.', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक भाषा पीढ़ी (एनएलजी) मॉडल में बढ़ती रुचि के बावजूद जो विविध आउटपुट का उत्पादन करते हैं, वर्तमान में एनएलजी प्रणाली की विविधता का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए कोई सैद्धांतिक विधि नहीं है। इस काम में, हम विविधता मैट्रिक्स का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए एक रूपरेखा का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। फ्रेमवर्क एक प्रस्तावित विविधता मीट्रिक और एक विविधता पैरामीटर के बीच सहसंबंध को मापता है, एक एकल पैरामीटर जो उत्पन्न पाठ में विविधता के कुछ पहलू को नियंत्रित करता है। उदाहरण के लिए, एक विविधता पैरामीटर एक बाइनरी चर हो सकता है जिसका उपयोग क्राउडसोर्सिंग श्रमिकों को कम या उच्च सामग्री विविधता के साथ पाठ उत्पन्न करने का निर्देश देने के लिए किया जाता है। हम अपने ढांचे की उपयोगिता को प्रदर्शित करते हैं: (ए) मनुष्यों से विविधता के फैसले को प्राप्त करने के लिए सर्वोत्तम प्रथाओं की स्थापना, (बी) यह दिखाते हुए कि मनुष्य सामग्री विविधता का अनुमान लगाने में स्वचालित मीट्रिक को काफी हद तक बेहतर करते हैं, और (सी) यह प्रदर्शित करते हुए कि "डिकोडिंग पैरामीटर" ट्यूनिंग करके विविधता को नियंत्रित करने के लिए मौजूदा तरीके ज्यादातर रूप को प्रभावित करते हैं लेकिन अर्थ नहीं। हमारा ढांचा विभिन्न विविधता मीट्रिक की समझ को आगे बढ़ा सकता है, जो बेहतर एनएलजी प्रणालियों की दिशा में सड़क पर एक आवश्यक कदम है।', 'ga': 'In ainneoin an tsuim atá ag méadú i múnlaí giniúna teanga nádúrtha (NLG) a tháirgeann aschuir ilghnéitheacha, níl aon mhodh prionsabal ann faoi láthair chun éagsúlacht chóras NLG a mheas. San obair seo, molaimid creat chun méadracht éagsúlachta a mheas. Tomhaiseann an creat an comhghaol idir méadrach éagsúlachta atá beartaithe agus paraiméadar éagsúlachta, paraiméadar aonair a rialaíonn gné éigin den éagsúlacht sa téacs ginte. Mar shampla, d’fhéadfadh paraiméadar éagsúlachta a bheith ina athróg dhénártha a úsáidtear chun treoir a thabhairt d’oibrithe sluafhoinsithe téacs a ghiniúint le héagsúlacht ábhair íseal nó ard. Léirímid úsáideacht ár gcreat trí: (a) dea-chleachtais a bhunú chun breithiúnais éagsúlachta a fháil ó dhaoine, (b) a thaispeáint go sáraíonn daoine méadracht uathoibríoch go substaintiúil maidir le héagsúlacht ábhar a mheas, agus (c) a léiriú go bhfuil modhanna reatha chun éagsúlacht a rialú trí thiúnadh. cuireann “paraiméadar díchódaithe” isteach go príomha ar fhoirm ach ní ar an gciall. Is féidir lenár gcreat an tuiscint ar mhéadrachtaí éagsúla éagsúlachta a chur chun cinn, céim riachtanach ar an mbóthar i dtreo córais NLG níos fearr.', 'ka': 'მოდელების თნტერესტი, რომლებიც განსხვავებული გამოსახულებების გამოყენებას გამოყენებს, მიმდინარე არ არის პრინციპური მეთოდი NLG სისტემის განსხვავება. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ მინდა განსხვავებული მეტრიკის განსაზღვრებისთვის ფრამეტრი. პარამეტრის კორელეციას მიზეზიან მიზეზებული განსხვავებული მეტრიკის და განსხვავებული პარამეტრის შორის, ერთი პარამეტრი, რომელიც განსხვავებული ტექსტის განსხვავების განს მაგალითად, განსხვავებული პარამეტრი შეიძლება იყოს ბინარი განსხვავებული განსხვავება, რომელიც გამოიყენება მუშაობის სამუშაო მუშაო მუშაო მუშაო ჩვენ ჩვენი ფრამეტრის სუტელიტის გამოყენება აჩვენებთ: a) უკეთესი პროგრამის განსხვავება ადამიანების განსხვავებების გამოყენება, b) გამოჩვენება, რომ ადამიანები ძალიან მეტრიკის გამოყენება სამყარო განსხვავებაში, და c) გამოჩვენება, რომ მსგავსი განსხვ ჩვენი პარამეტრები შეიძლება გავაკეთოთ განსხვავებული განსხვავებული მეტრიკის შესახებ, მნიშვნელოვანი ნაწილად საზოგადო NLG სისტემაში.', 'el': 'Παρά το αυξανόμενο ενδιαφέρον για μοντέλα δημιουργίας φυσικών γλωσσών που παράγουν ποικίλα αποτελέσματα, δεν υπάρχει επί του παρόντος καμία θεμελιώδης μέθοδος για την αξιολόγηση της ποικιλομορφίας ενός συστήματος. Στην εργασία αυτή, προτείνουμε ένα πλαίσιο για την αξιολόγηση των μετρήσεων ποικιλομορφίας. Το πλαίσιο μετρά τη συσχέτιση μεταξύ μιας προτεινόμενης μετρικής ποικιλομορφίας και μιας παραμέτρου ποικιλομορφίας, μιας ενιαίας παραμέτρου που ελέγχει κάποια πτυχή της ποικιλομορφίας στο παραγόμενο κείμενο. Για παράδειγμα, μια παράμετρος ποικιλομορφίας μπορεί να είναι μια δυαδική μεταβλητή που χρησιμοποιείται για να καθοδηγήσει τους εργαζόμενους να παράγουν κείμενο με χαμηλή ή υψηλή ποικιλομορφία περιεχομένου. Αποδεικνύουμε τη χρησιμότητα του πλαισίου μας: (α) θεσπίζοντας βέλτιστες πρακτικές για την εξαγωγή κρίσεων ποικιλομορφίας από τους ανθρώπους, (β) δείχνοντας ότι οι άνθρωποι ξεπερνούν σημαντικά τις αυτόματες μετρήσεις στην εκτίμηση της ποικιλομορφίας περιεχομένου, και (γ) αποδεικνύοντας ότι οι υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι ελέγχου της ποικιλομορφίας με τον συντονισμό μιας "παραμέτρου αποκωδικοποίησης" επηρεάζουν κυρίως τη μορφή αλλά όχι το νόημα. Το πλαίσιο μας μπορεί να προωθήσει την κατανόηση των διαφορετικών μετρήσεων ποικιλομορφίας, ένα ουσιαστικό βήμα στο δρόμο προς τα καλύτερα συστήματα.', 'it': "Nonostante il crescente interesse per i modelli di generazione del linguaggio naturale (NLG) che producono risultati diversi, attualmente non esiste un metodo basato su principi per valutare la diversità di un sistema NLG. In questo lavoro, proponiamo un framework per valutare le metriche della diversità. Il framework misura la correlazione tra una metrica di diversità proposta e un parametro di diversità, un unico parametro che controlla alcuni aspetti della diversità nel testo generato. Ad esempio, un parametro diversity potrebbe essere una variabile binaria utilizzata per istruire i dipendenti del crowdsourcing a generare testo con diversità di contenuti bassa o elevata. Dimostriamo l'utilità del nostro framework: (a) stabilendo best practice per ottenere giudizi sulla diversità dagli esseri umani, (b) mostrando che gli esseri umani superano sostanzialmente le metriche automatiche nella stima della diversità dei contenuti e (c) dimostrando che i metodi esistenti per controllare la diversità sintonizzando un 'parametro di decodifica' influenzano principalmente la forma, ma non il significato. Il nostro framework può migliorare la comprensione delle diverse metriche di diversità, un passo essenziale sulla strada verso sistemi NLG migliori.", 'lt': 'Nepaisant vis didesnio susidomėjimo gamtinių kalbų gamybos (NLG) modeliais, kurie gamina įvairius rezultatus, šiuo metu nėra pagrindinio NLG sistemos įvairovės vertinimo metodo. Šiame darbe siūlome įvairovės rodiklių vertinimo sistemą. The framework measures the correlation between a proposed diversity metric and a diversity parameter, a single parameter that controls some aspect of diversity in generated text.  Pavyzdžiui, įvairovės parametras gali būti dvigubas kintamasis, naudojamas mokant visuomenės išteklius naudojančius darbuotojus gaminti tekstą, turintį mažą arba didelę įvairovę. Mes įrodome savo sistemos naudingumą: a) nustatydami geriausią patirtį, leidžiančią priimti žmonių sprendimus dėl įvairovės, b) įrodydami, kad žmonės gerokai viršija automatinius rodiklius vertinant turinio įvairovę, ir c) įrodydami, kad esami įvairovės kontrolės metodai pritaikydami "kodavimo parametrą" daugiausia daro poveikį formai, bet ne reikšmei. Our framework can advance the understanding of different diversity metrics, an essential step on the road towards better NLG systems.', 'hu': 'Annak ellenére, hogy egyre növekvő érdeklődés van a természetes nyelv generálására (NLG) modellek iránt, amelyek különböző kimeneteket eredményeznek, jelenleg nincs elvi módszer az NLG rendszer sokszínűségének értékelésére. Ebben a munkában egy keretrendszert javasolunk a sokszínűségi mutatók értékelésére. A keretrendszer méri a javasolt sokszínűségi metrika és a sokszínűségi paraméter közötti korrelációt, amely egyetlen paraméter, amely a létrehozott szöveg sokszínűségének bizonyos aspektusait szabályozza. A diversity paraméter például egy bináris változó lehet, amely arra utasítja a közösségi források dolgozóit, hogy alacsony vagy nagy tartalommal rendelkező szövegeket hozzanak létre. Keretrendszerünk hasznosságát a következőkkel mutatjuk be: (a) bevált gyakorlatok kialakításával az emberektől a sokszínűség megítélésére, (b) bemutatjuk, hogy az emberek lényegesen felülmúlják az automatikus mutatókat a tartalom sokszínűségének becslésében, és (c) bemutatjuk, hogy a sokszínűség ellenőrzésére szolgáló meglévő módszerek egy "dekódolási paraméter" hangolásával leginkább befolyásolják a formát, de nem a jelentést. Keretrendszerünk elősegítheti a különböző sokszínűségi mutatók megértését, ami lényeges lépés a jobb NLG-rendszerek felé vezető úton.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ തലമുറയില്\u200d താല്പര്യം വര്\u200dദ്ധിച്ചാലും വ്യത്യസ്ത വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ഇപ്പോള്\u200d N In this work, we propose a framework for evaluating diversity metrics.  പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യസ്ത മീറ്റരിക്കും വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ഒരു പരാമീറ്റരും തമ്മിലുള്ള ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതാണ് ഫ് ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി, ഒരു വ്യത്യസ്തമായ പരാമീറ്റര്\u200d ഒരു ബൈനറി വേരിയല്\u200d ആയിരിക്കാം, കുറഞ്ഞ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ഉയര്\u200dന്നിരിക്കുന്ന വ്യത് നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമ്പോര്\u200dക്കിന്റെ ഉപയോഗം നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു: (a) മനുഷ്യരില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്ത വിധികള്\u200d പ്രേരിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഏറ്റവും നല്ല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d സ്ഥാപിക്കുന്നത്, (b) മനുഷ് നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമാര്\u200dക്ക് വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യസ്ത മെട്രിക്കങ്ങളുടെ മനസ്സിന് മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടാന്\u200d കഴിയും, നല്ല NLG സിസ്റ', 'mk': "И покрај растечкиот интерес за природната генерација на јазици (НЛГ) модели кои произведуваат различни излези, моментално нема принципиран метод за проценка на различноста на системот НЛГ. Во оваа работа предложуваме рамка за проценка на метриката на различноста. Рамката ја мери корелацијата помеѓу предложената метрична разновидност и параметарот на разновидност, еден параметар кој контролира некои аспекти на разновидност во генерираниот текст. На пример, параметарот за разновидност може да биде бинарна променлива која се користи за да ги инструктира работниците на пулсурсирање да генерираат текст со ниска или висока разновидност на содржина. We demonstrate the utility of our framework by: (a) establishing best practices for eliciting diversity judgments from humans, (b) showing that humans substantially outperform automatic metrics in estimating content diversity, and (c) demonstrating that existing methods for controlling diversity by tuning a 'decoding parameter' mostly affect form but not meaning.  Our framework can advance the understanding of different diversity metrics, an essential step on the road towards better NLG systems.", 'ms': "Walaupun kepentingan semakin meningkat dalam model generasi bahasa alam (NLG) yang menghasilkan output berbeza, kini tiada kaedah prinsip untuk menilai kebanyakan sistem NLG. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangan untuk menilai metrik pelbagai. Bingkai ukur korelasi antara metrik pelbagai dan parameter pelbagai yang direncanakan, parameter tunggal yang mengawal beberapa aspek pelbagai dalam teks yang dijana. For example, a diversity parameter might be a binary variable used to instruct crowdsourcing workers to generate text with either low or high content diversity.  Kami menunjukkan utiliti kerangka kami dengan: (a) menetapkan praktek terbaik untuk mengakibatkan penilaian pelbagai dari manusia, (b) menunjukkan bahawa manusia secara konsisten melampaui metrik automatik dalam menghargai pelbagai kandungan, dan (c) menunjukkan bahawa kaedah sedia ada untuk mengawal pelbagai dengan menyesuaikan 'parameter penyahkodan' kebanyakan mempengaruhi bentuk tetapi tidak bermakna. kerangka kita boleh maju pemahaman metrik pelbagai pelbagai, langkah penting di jalan ke arah sistem NLG yang lebih baik.", 'kk': 'Түзіндік тілдерді құру үлгілеріне қарай, әртүрлі нәтижелерді құру үлгілеріне қарай, NLG жүйесінің әртүрлігін бағалау үшін негізгі әдіс жоқ. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз әртүрлі метрикалық оқу үшін бағдарламаны ұсынамыз. Бұл бағдарлама келтірілген әртүрлі метрикалық пен әртүрлі параметрлердің арасындағы корреляцияны, құрылған мәтінде әртүрлі қасиеттерді бақылайтын бір параметр. Мысалы, көпшілік параметрлері көпшілік көпшіліктерді мәтінді төмен немесе жоғары мазмұның көпшілігімен құру үшін қолданылатын бинарлық айнымалысы болуы Біз қоршауымыздың утилитациясын: a) адамдардан айырмашылық тәжірибелерді таңдау үшін ең жақсы тәжірибелерді орнату, b) адамдардың мазмұның айырмашылығын бағалау үшін автоматты метрикалық метрикалық көпшілігін бағалау үшін көпшілікті көпші Біздің бағыттамыз әртүрлі метрикалық түсініктерін, NLG жүйелеріне жақсы көмектесу үшін негізгі қадам түсініп алады.', 'mt': "Minkejja l-interess dejjem jikber fil-mudelli tal-ġenerazzjoni tal-lingwi naturali (NLG) li jipproduċu riżultati differenti, bħalissa m’hemmx metodu ta’ prinċipju għall-evalwazzjoni tad-diversità ta’ sistema NLG. F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nipproponu qafas għall-evalwazzjoni tal-metriċi tad-diversità. Il-qafas ikejjel il-korrelazzjoni bejn il-metrika tad-diversità proposta u parametru tad-diversità, parametru wieħed li jikkontrolla xi aspett tad-diversità fit-test iġġenerat. Pereżempju, parametru ta’ diversità jista’ jkun varjabbli binarju użat biex jgħallem lill-ħaddiema crowdsourcing jiġġeneraw test b’diversità ta’ kontenut baxx jew għoli. Aħna nippruvaw l-utilità tal-qafas tagħna billi: (a) nistabbilixxu l-a ħjar prattiki biex jinħolqu sentenzi tad-diversità mill-bnedmin, (b) nippruvaw li l-bnedmin iwettqu metriċi awtomatiċi b'mod sostanzjali fl-istima tad-diversità tal-kontenut, u (c) nippruvaw li l-metodi eżistenti għall-kontroll tad-diversità permezz tal-aġġustament ta' 'parametru tad-dekodifikazzjoni' jaffet Il-qafas tagħna jista’ javvanza l-fehim tal-metriċi differenti tad-diversità, pass essenzjali fit-triq lejn sistemi NLG aħjar.", 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл төрөлхтний сонирхол (NLG) загварын үр дүнг бүтээж буй загваруудын тулд ихэвчлэн ихэвчлэн нэмэгддэг ч одоо NLG системийн өөрчлөлтийг үнэлэх үндсэн арга байхгүй. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид олон төрлийн метриктикийг үнэлэх хэмжээг санал болгож байна. Үндсэн хэлбэрүүд санал өгсөн төрлийн метрик болон олон төрлийн параметр хоорондын холбоотой холбоотой байдлыг хэмжээгээр дүрслэгддэг. Жишээлбэл, олон нийтлэг параметр нь бага эсвэл өндөр бүтээгдэхүүний олон нийтлэг бүтээгдэхүүнтэй текст бүтээхийг зааж ашигладаг хоёр давхар хувьсагч байж магадгүй. Бид өөрсдийнхөө хөрөнгө оруулалтыг харуулж байна: a) хүн төрөлхтний олон төрлийн шийдвэрлэлүүдийн сайн дасгал хөдөлгөөн, b) хүн төрөлхтний олон төрлийн төрлийн тооцоололтоор автоматикийн метрикийг автоматикийн хэмжээсүүдийг баталж чаддаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. c) олон төрлийн арга нь " Бидний үйл ажиллагаа олон төрлийн метриктикийн ойлголтыг хөгжүүлж чадна. НLG системийн сайхан зам руу илүү чухал алхам юм.', 'ro': 'În ciuda interesului crescând față de modelele de generare a limbajului natural (NLG) care produc rezultate diverse, în prezent nu există o metodă principială pentru evaluarea diversității unui sistem NLG. În această lucrare, propunem un cadru de evaluare a valorilor diversității. Cadrul măsoară corelația dintre o metrică de diversitate propusă și un parametru de diversitate, un singur parametru care controlează anumite aspecte ale diversității în textul generat. De exemplu, un parametru de diversitate ar putea fi o variabilă binară utilizată pentru a instrui lucrătorii din crowdsourcing să genereze text cu diversitate de conținut scăzută sau ridicată. Demonstrăm utilitatea cadrului nostru prin: (a) stabilirea celor mai bune practici pentru a provoca evaluări ale diversității de la oameni, (b) arătând că oamenii depășesc substanțial măsurătorile automate în estimarea diversității conținutului și (c) demonstrând că metodele existente de control al diversității prin reglarea unui "parametru de decodare" afectează în principal forma, dar nu sensul. Cadrul nostru poate îmbunătăți înțelegerea diferitelor măsurători de diversitate, un pas esențial pe drumul către sisteme de GNL mai bune.', 'no': 'Til tross å auke interesse på naturspråk-genereringsmodeller (NLG), som produserer ulike utgåver, er det no ingen hovudmetode for å evaluera ulikheten av eit NLG-system. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi eit rammeverk for å evaluera ulike metrikar. Rammeverket målar korrelasjonen mellom ein foreslått måltighetsmetrisk og ein måltighetsparameter, ein enkel parameter som styrer ein del aspekt av mangfoldighet i generert tekst. For eksempel kan ein diversitet parameter vera ein binærvariabel brukt for å instruere folkkjerne arbeidarar til å laga tekst med enten låg eller høg innhaldsdiversitet. Vi demonstrerer verktøyet på rammeverket vårt med: a) å oppretta beste praksis for å forstå forskjellige sprøytebrukar frå mennesker, b) viser at mennesker større utfører automatiske metrikar i å vurdere forskjellighet i innhaldet, og c) viser at eksisterande metodar for å kontrollere forskjellighet ved å tunera ein «dekoding parameter» hovudsakelig påvirkar forma, men ikkje mening. Vårt rammeverk kan forbetra forståelse av ulike ulike forskjellige metrikar, ein viktig steg på veien mot bedre NLG-systemer.', 'si': 'ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරභාවිත (NLG) මොඩේල් එක්ක විවිධ ප්\u200dරභාවිත විශේෂයක් වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරභාවිත විදිහට වි මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා විවිධාන මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් විශ්වාස කරන්න. සංවිධානය සහ විවිධ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් අතර සම්බන්ධ විවිධානයක් අතර සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් විවිධානය සහ වි උදාහරණයෙන්, විවිධ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පුළුවන් වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා අපේ පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය (a) ස්ථාපනය කරනවා හොඳ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා මිනිස්සුන්ගෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, (b) ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා මිනිස්සුන් හොඳ අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පුළුවන් වෙනස් විවිධ විවිධ මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් ගැන තේරුම් ගන්න, විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණයෙන් ප්\u200d', 'sr': 'Uprkos rastućem interesu u modele generacije prirodnog jezika (NLG), koji proizvode različite ishode, trenutno nema principalnog metoda za procjenu raznolikosti NLG-a. U ovom poslu predlažemo okvir za procjenu metrika raznolikosti. Okvir mjeri korelaciju između predloženog metričkog raznolikosti i parametra raznolikosti, jednog parametra koji kontrolira neke aspekte raznolikosti u proizvedenom tekstu. Na primjer, raznolikost bi mogao biti binarna varijabla koja se koristi za uputstvo radnika sa crowdsourcing da stvore tekst sa niskom ili visokom raznolikošću sadržaja. Mi pokazujemo korisnost našeg okvira: a) utvrđivanje najboljih prakse za ispunjavanje sudova o raznolikosti od ljudi, b) pokazujući da ljudi značajno iznosi automatsku metriku u procjeni raznolikosti sadržaja, i c) pokazuju da postojeće metode za kontrolu raznolikosti nastavljajući "parameter dekodiranja" uglavnom utječe na oblik, ali ne znači. Naš okvir može unaprijediti razumijevanje različitih metrika raznolikosti, osnovni korak na putu ka boljim NLG sistemima.', 'pl': 'Pomimo rosnącego zainteresowania modelami generowania języka naturalnego (NLG), które generują zróżnicowane wyniki, obecnie nie ma zasadniczej metody oceny różnorodności systemu NLG. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy ramy oceny wskaźników różnorodności. Ramy mierzą korelację między proponowaną metryką różnorodności a parametrem różnorodności, pojedynczym parametrem kontrolującym pewny aspekt różnorodności w wygenerowanym tekście. Na przykład parametr różnorodności może być zmienną binarną używaną do instrukcji pracowników crowdsourcingu generowania tekstu o niskiej lub dużej różnorodności treści. Wykazujemy użyteczność naszych ram poprzez: (a) ustanowienie najlepszych praktyk w zakresie wyciągania ocen różnorodności od ludzi, (b) pokazanie, że ludzie znacznie przewyższają automatyczne wskaźniki w szacowaniu różnorodności treści oraz (c) wykazanie, że istniejące metody kontrolowania różnorodności poprzez dostrojenie "parametru dekodowania" w większości wpływają na formę, ale nie na znaczenie. Nasze ramy mogą zwiększyć zrozumienie różnych wskaźników różnorodności, co stanowi istotny krok na drodze do lepszych systemów NLG.', 'sv': 'Trots ett växande intresse för NLG-modeller (Natural Language Generation) som ger olika resultat finns det för närvarande ingen principbaserad metod för att utvärdera mångfalden i ett NLG-system. I detta arbete föreslår vi ett ramverk för utvärdering av mångfaldsmått. Ramverket mäter korrelationen mellan ett föreslaget mångfaldsmått och en mångfaldsparameter, en enda parameter som styr vissa aspekter av mångfald i genererad text. En mångfaldsparameter kan till exempel vara en binär variabel som används för att instruera medarbetare i crowdsourcing att generera text med antingen låg eller hög innehållsmångfald. Vi demonstrerar nyttan av vårt ramverk genom att: (a) fastställa bästa praxis för att framkalla mångfaldsbedömningar från människor, (b) visa att människor väsentligt överträffar automatiska mätvärden när det gäller att uppskatta innehållsmångfald, och (c) visa att befintliga metoder för att kontrollera mångfald genom att justera en "avkodningsparameter" främst påverkar form men inte mening. Vårt ramverk kan öka förståelsen för olika mångfaldsmått, ett viktigt steg på vägen mot bättre NLG-system.', 'ta': '@ info: whatsthis இந்த வேலையில், பல்வேறு முறைகளை மதிப்பதற்கான ஒரு சட்டத்தை நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். சட்டத்தின் தொடர்பை தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட பல்வேறு அளவுருக்கள் மற்றும் பல்வேறு அளபுரு எடுத்துக்காட்டாக, ஒரு பலவிதமான அளபுருவு ஒரு இருமுறை மாறியாக இருக்கலாம், குறைந்த அல்லது உயர்ந்த உள்ளடக்கங்களின் மாறுபாடு  நாம் எங்கள் சட்டத்தின் பயன்பாட்டை காட்டுகிறோம்: (a) மனிதர்களிடமிருந்து பல்வேறு தீர்ப்புகளை வெளிப்படுத்த முடியும் சிறந்த செயல்களை உறுதிப்படுத்துவதற்காக (b) மனிதர்கள் தன்னியக்கமாக மெட்ரிக்களை மதிப எங்கள் சட்டத்தில் பல்வேறு முறைகளின் புரிந்து கொள்ள முடியும், சிறந்த NLG முறைமைகளின் பாதையில் ஒரு முக்கியமா', 'so': 'Inkastoo aad u koreyso xiisaha ku saabsan danbiyada afka dabiicadda (NLG) modellada soo saara midhaha kala duduwan, hadda ma jirto qaab madax ah oo qiimeynaya kala duduwan nidaamka NLG. Markaas waxan, waxaynu horumarinaynaa shuruudo aan qiimeynayno metricooyin kala duduwan. Qoraalka ayaa qiyaasa xiriirka kala duduwan iyo parameter kala duduwan, isku parameter oo maamula dhinac kala duduwan oo ku qoran text. Tusaale ahaan parameter kala duduwan waxay noqon kartaa mid kala bedela labaad oo la isticmaalay in la baro shaqaalaha kooxaha dadka laga isticmaalo inay sameeyaan qoraal ay ku dhashaan kala duduwan waxyaabaha hoose ama aad u sareeya. Waxaynu muujinnaa isticmaalka fircoonkeena: (a) dhisidda habab ugu wanaagsan in loo soo saaro xukunno kala duduwan ee dadka, (b) lagu tuso in dadku ay si badan u sameeyaan metritooyin automatic si ay u sameeyaan qiimeeyaan kala duduwan, iyo (c) si ay u muujiyaan qaabada joogta oo ay u maamulaan kala duduwan, si ay ugu badnaan u saameyso nooca diidnaanta, laakiin aan micnaha ahayn. Midabkayaga ayaa horumarin kara garashada qaababka kala duduwan oo kala duduwan, tallaabo muhiim ah oo ku socda jidka si loo hagaajiyo nidaamka NLG.', 'ur': "اگرچہ طبیعی زبان کی پیدائش (NLG) موڈلوں میں اضافہ ہوتا ہے جو مختلف نتائج پیدا کرتی ہیں، اب ایک NLG سیستم کی مختلف طریقے کا ارزش کرنے کے لئے کوئی اصلی طریقہ نہیں ہے. ہم اس کام میں ایک فرم پیش کریں گے کہ مختلف متریک کا ارزش کریں۔ فرمیک ایک پیشنهاد کی مختلف متریک اور ایک مختلف پارامیٹر کے درمیان تعلق کا اندازہ کرتا ہے، ایک پارامیٹر جو پیدا کیا گیا متفرق کے کچھ حصے کا کنٹرول کرتا ہے. مثال، ایک مختلف پارامیٹر ممکن ہے کہ ایک دوئناری ویرئیٹر ہو سکتا ہے جو جمعیت سورسینگ کارکنوں کو تفصیل دینے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے کہ ان کے ساتھ تفصیل پیدا کریں یا کم یا بلند منصفات مختل ہم نے اپنے فرمود کا فائدہ دکھایا کہ: a) لوگوں سے مختلف فیصلہ کرنے کے لئے بہترین طریقے مقرر کرنے کے لئے، b) دکھاتے ہیں کہ انسانوں نے اپنا منظور مختلف مطابق مطابق کے مطابق اپنا منظور زیادہ استعمال کیا ہے، اور (c) دکھاتے ہیں کہ مختلف طریقے کی کنٹرول کرنے کے لئے موجود ہیں، ایک 'ڈیکڈ پارامیٹ'  ہمارا فرمود مختلف مختلف متریک کی سمجھ کو آگے بڑھا سکتا ہے، ایک اچھی NLG سیستموں کی طرف مسیر پر ضروری قدم ہے.", 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Bu ishda, biz har xil metriklarni qiymatish uchun freymni o'ylaymiz. Name Masalan, muloqat parametrlar, bir necha yoki katta tarkibi tarkibini yaratish mumkin. Biz freymizning foydalanishimizni ko'rsatdik: (a) odamning turli xukunalarni olish uchun eng yaxshi ish oynalarni ko'rsatish mumkin, (b) odamlar o'zgarishni o'zgartirish uchun avtomatik metriklarni o'zgartirish mumkin, va (c) har xil tarkibini o'zgartirish uchun mavjud usullarni ko'rsatish mumkin. Bizning freymimiz har xil metriklarni o'rganish mumkin, yaxshi NLG tizimlariga yordamida muhim qadam beradi.", 'vi': "Mặc dù sự chú ý với các mô hình ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (NLG) sản xuất xuất xuất xuất hàng loạt, hiện tại không có phương pháp chính yếu để đánh giá sự đa dạng của hệ thống NILG. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề xuất một cơ sở để đánh giá tỉ lệ đa dạng. Các khung chiếu định hướng sự tương quan giữa thước đo đa dạng đề xuất và tham số đa dạng, một tham số duy nhất điều khiển một số khía cạnh đa dạng trong văn bản đã tạo ra. Ví dụ, một tham số đa dạng có thể là một biến số nhị phân được dùng để hướng công nhân cách đông đúc tạo văn bản với đa dạng chất thấp hay cao. Chúng tôi thể hiện lợi ích c ủa cơ sở này b ằng: a) thiết lập tốt nhất để gây ra những phán xét về sự đa dạng từ con người, b) cho thấy con người thực hiện những thước đo tự động vượt trội trong việc ước tính đa dạng nội dung, và c) cho thấy các phương pháp có để kiểm soát đa dạng bằng cách bật một tham số'mã hóa'ảnh hưởng chủ yếu đến hình dạng nhưng không có ý nghĩa. Cơ chế của chúng ta có thể nâng cao sự hiểu biết về lượng đo đa dạng khác nhau, một bước quan trọng trên đường tới hệ thống NIG tốt hơn.", 'nl': "Ondanks de groeiende interesse in Natural Language Generation (NLG) modellen die diverse outputs produceren, is er momenteel geen principiële methode om de diversiteit van een NLG systeem te evalueren. In dit werk stellen we een kader voor het evalueren van diversiteitsmetrieken voor. Het raamwerk meet de correlatie tussen een voorgestelde diversiteitsmetrik en een diversiteitsparameter, een enkele parameter die een aspect van diversiteit in gegenereerde tekst controleert. Een diversiteitsparameter kan bijvoorbeeld een binaire variabele zijn die wordt gebruikt om crowdsourcing werknemers te instrueren tekst te genereren met een lage of hoge inhoudsdiversiteit. We tonen het nut van ons framework aan door: (a) het vaststellen van best practices voor het verkrijgen van diversiteitsbeoordelen van mensen, (b) aan te tonen dat mensen aanzienlijk beter presteren dan automatische metrics in het schatten van inhoudsdiversiteit, en (c) aan te tonen dat bestaande methoden voor het beheersen van diversiteit door het afstemmen van een 'decoderingsparameter' meestal invloed hebben op de vorm maar niet op de betekenis. Ons framework kan het begrip van verschillende diversiteitsmetrieken bevorderen, een essentiële stap op weg naar betere NLG-systemen.", 'da': "På trods af den stigende interesse for NLG-modeller, der producerer forskellige output, er der i øjeblikket ingen principbaseret metode til at vurdere mangfoldigheden af et NLG-system. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en ramme for evaluering af diversitetsmålinger. Rammen måler sammenhængen mellem en foreslået diversitetsmetrik og en diversitetsparameter, en enkelt parameter, der styrer nogle aspekter af diversitet i genereret tekst. En diversitetsparameter kan f.eks. være en binær variabel, der bruges til at instruere medarbejdere i crowdsourcing om at generere tekst med enten lav eller høj diversitet i indholdet. Vi demonstrerer nytten af vores rammer ved at: (a) etablere bedste praksis for at fremkalde mangfoldighedsvurderinger fra mennesker, (b) vise, at mennesker i væsentlig grad overgår automatiske målinger i estimering af indholdsforskelighed, og (c) demonstrere, at eksisterende metoder til kontrol af mangfoldighed ved at justere en 'afkodningsparameter' hovedsageligt påvirker form, men ikke mening. Vores rammer kan fremme forståelsen af forskellige diversitetsmålinger, et vigtigt skridt på vejen mod bedre NLG-systemer.", 'hr': 'Uprkos povećanju interesa u modele generacije prirodnog jezika (NLG) koji proizvode različite ishode, trenutno nema načelnog metoda za procjenu raznolikosti NLG-a. U ovom poslu predlažemo okvir za procjenu metrika raznolikosti. Okvir mjeri korelaciju između predloženog metričkog raznolikosti i parametra raznolikosti, jednog parametra koji kontrolira neke aspekte raznolikosti u proizvedenom tekstu. Na primjer, parameter raznolikosti može biti binarna promjena koja se koristi kako bi se uputila radnicima iz crowdsourcing da stvore tekst sa niskim ili visokom raznolikošću sadržaja. Mi pokazujemo korisnost našeg okvira: a) utvrđivanje najboljih prakse za izbjegavanje osuđenja o raznolikosti od ljudi, b) pokazujući da ljudi značajno iznosi automatsku metriku u procjeni raznolikosti sadržaja, i c) pokazuju da postojeće metode kontrole raznolikosti prilagođenjem "parametra dekodiranja" uglavnom utječe na oblik, ali ne znači. Naš okvir može unaprijediti razumijevanje različitih metrika raznolikosti, temeljnog koraka na putu ka boljim NLG sustavima.', 'bg': 'Въпреки нарастващия интерес към моделите за генериране на естествен език (НЛГ), които произвеждат разнообразни резултати, понастоящем няма принципен метод за оценка на разнообразието на системата на НЛГ. В тази работа предлагаме рамка за оценка на показателите за многообразието. Рамката измерва корелацията между предложен метрик за разнообразие и параметър за разнообразие, един параметър, който контролира някои аспекти на разнообразието в генерирания текст. Например параметърът за многообразие може да бъде двоична променлива, използвана за инструктиране на работниците за кроудсорсинг да генерират текст с ниско или високо съдържание на многообразие. Ние демонстрираме полезността на нашата рамка, като: (а) установяваме най-добри практики за извличане на преценки за многообразието от хората, (б) показваме, че хората значително превъзхождат автоматичните показатели при оценяването на многообразието на съдържанието и (в) демонстрираме, че съществуващите методи за контролиране на многообразието чрез настройване на "декодиращ параметър" засягат предимно формата, но не значението. Нашата рамка може да подобри разбирането на различните показатели за многообразието, съществена стъпка по пътя към по-добри системи за НЛГ.', 'de': 'Trotz des wachsenden Interesses an Modellen zur Generierung natürlicher Sprache (NLG), die unterschiedliche Outputs produzieren, gibt es derzeit keine prinzipielle Methode zur Bewertung der Diversität eines NLG-Systems. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir einen Rahmen für die Bewertung von Diversity Metriken vor. Das Framework misst die Korrelation zwischen einer vorgeschlagenen Diversitätsmetrik und einem Diversitätsparameter, einem einzigen Parameter, der einen Aspekt der Diversität im generierten Text steuert. Ein Diversity-Parameter kann beispielsweise eine binäre Variable sein, die Crowdsourcing-Mitarbeiter anweisen, Text mit geringer oder hoher Inhaltsvielfalt zu generieren. Wir demonstrieren die Nützlichkeit unseres Frameworks, indem: (a) Best Practices für die Auslösung von Diversitätsbeurteilungen von Menschen etabliert werden, (b) gezeigt wird, dass Menschen automatische Metriken bei der Schätzung von Inhaltsdiversität erheblich übertreffen, und (c) gezeigt wird, dass bestehende Methoden zur Steuerung von Diversität durch Abstimmung eines "Decodierungsparameters" hauptsächlich die Form, aber nicht die Bedeutung beeinflussen. Unser Framework kann das Verständnis verschiedener Diversitätsmetriken fördern, ein wesentlicher Schritt auf dem Weg zu besseren NLG-Systemen.', 'ko': "수출이 다른 자연언어생성(NLG) 모델에 대한 관심이 커지고 있지만, NLG 시스템의 다양성을 평가하는 원칙적인 방법은 아직 없다.이 작업에서 우리는 다양성 지표를 평가하는 틀을 제시했다.이 프레임워크 측정에서 제시한 다양성 도량과 다양성 매개 변수 간의 상관성은 다양성 매개 변수는 텍스트의 다양성을 생성하는 어떤 방면의 단일 매개 변수를 제어하는 것이다.예를 들어 다양성 매개 변수는 하청 직원들이 내용의 다양성이 낮거나 높은 텍스트를 생성하도록 지시하는 2진 변수일 수 있다.우리는 다음과 같은 방식을 통해 우리의 구조의 실용성을 증명했다. (a) 인류로부터 다양성 판단을 얻는 가장 좋은 실천을 구축했다. (b)는 인류가 내용의 다양성을 평가하는 데 있어서 자동 도량보다 훨씬 낫다는 것을 나타낸다. 그리고 (c)는'디코딩 파라미터'를 조정하여 다양성을 제어하는 기존의 방법이 의미가 아니라 형식에 영향을 미친다는 것을 증명했다.우리의 틀은 서로 다른 다양성 지표에 대한 이해를 촉진할 수 있는데 이것은 더 나은 NLG 시스템으로 나아가는 중요한 걸음이다.", 'id': 'Meskipun tertarik meningkat pada model generasi bahasa alam (NLG) yang menghasilkan output yang berbeda, saat ini tidak ada metode prinsip untuk mengevaluasi kebanyakan sistem NLG. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan cadangan untuk mengevaluasi metrik diversitas. Cadangan mengukur korelasi antara metrik diversitas yang diusulkan dan parameter diversitas, parameter tunggal yang mengendalikan beberapa aspek diversitas dalam teks yang dihasilkan. Contohnya, parameter diversitas mungkin merupakan variabel binari yang digunakan untuk mengajarkan para pekerja crowdsourcing untuk menghasilkan teks dengan diversitas konten rendah atau tinggi. Kami menunjukkan utilitas dari cadangan kami dengan: (a) mendirikan praktek terbaik untuk mengakibatkan penilaian kebanyakan dari manusia, (b) menunjukkan bahwa manusia secara konsisten melebihi metrik otomatis dalam menghargai kebanyakan konten, dan (c) menunjukkan bahwa metode yang ada untuk mengendalikan kebanyakan kebanyakan mempengaruhi bentuk tetapi tidak berarti. kerangka kita dapat meningkatkan pemahaman dari metrik kebanyakan berbeda, langkah penting di jalan menuju sistem NLG yang lebih baik.', 'fa': 'با وجود رشد علاقه\u200cای به نسل زبان طبیعی (NLG) که نتیجه\u200cهای مختلف را تولید می\u200cکند، در حال حاضر هیچ روش اصلی برای ارزیابی تنوع سیستم NLG وجود ندارد. در این کار، ما یک چهارچوب برای ارزیابی متریک مختلف پیشنهاد می کنیم. چهارچوب ارتباط بین یک متریک تنوع پیشنهاد و یک پارامتر تنوع را اندازه می\u200cگیرد، یک پارامتر تنها که بعضی از منبع تنوع را در متن تولید کنترل می\u200cکند. برای مثال، یک پارامتر مختلف ممکن است یک متغیر دویینی باشد که برای دستور دادن کارگران سرمایه\u200cگذاری جمعیت برای تولید متن با مختلف محتویات پایین یا بالا استفاده می\u200cشود. ما استفاده از چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارمون را با: a) ثابت کردن بهترین تجربه\u200cهایی برای تحویل دادن قضاوت مختلف از انسان، b) نشان می\u200cدهیم که انسان\u200cها به طور زیادی متریک\u200cهای خودکار را در ارزیابی مختلف محتویات انجام می\u200cدهند، و (c) نشان می\u200cدهند که روش\u200c چهارچوب ما می تواند درک متریک های مختلف را پیشرفت کند، یک قدم ضروری بر جاده به سوی سیستم های NLG بهتر.', 'sw': "Pamoja na kuongezeka maslahi ya uzalishaji wa lugha asilia (NLG) unaotengeneza matokeo mbalimbali, kwa sasa hakuna njia ya msingi ya kutathmini tofauti ya mfumo wa NLG. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza mfumo wa kutathmini njia mbalimbali. Mfumo huu unaweza kuhamasisha uhusiano kati ya mbinu mbalimbali zilizopendekezwa na parameter tofauti, kipimo kimoja kinachodhibiti upande wa tofauti katika ujumbe uliotengenezwa. Kwa mfano, parameter mbalimbali inaweza kuwa mbadala wa binafsi uliotumika kuwafundisha wafanyakazi wa vyanzo vya umma kutengeneza ujumbe wa maandishi ikiwa na utofauti wa maudhui ya chini au kwa kiasi kikubwa. Tunaonyesha matumizi ya mfumo wetu kwa: (a) kutengeneza vitendo vyema kwa ajili ya kutafuta maamuzi mbalimbali kutoka kwa binadamu, (b) kuonyesha kwamba binadamu wanafanya mbinu za kujitegemea kwa kiasi kikubwa katika kutathmini utofauti wa maudhui, na (c) kuonyesha kuwa njia za kudhibiti tofauti kwa kutumia 'kifaa cha kupunguza' bado huathiri muundo lakini si maana. Miundombi yetu inaweza kuendelea kuelewa kwa mbinu tofauti tofauti, hatua muhimu kwenye barabarani kuelekea mifumo bora ya NLG.", 'tr': "Tebiýal dil döredilişinde gyzyklanýan nusgalarda (NLG) näçe çykyş çykyş eden nusgalarda, häzirçe NLG sisteminiň näçe görnüşini çykarmak üçin prinsip ýok. Bu işde, çeşitli metrikleri deňlemek üçin bir çerçew teklip edip görýäris. Çerçeve teklif eden bir çeşitli metrik we çeşitli parameterler arasynda, bir parameterdir, üretilen metin çeşitli aspektlerini kontrol eden. Örneğin, köpürler arasynda işleýän adamlary üçin ýakyn düşük ýa ýokary daşary meýdançalygy bilen metin üretmek üçin ullanýan bir baýnary üýtgeşik bolup biler. Bizim çerçevemizin kullanımını: (a) insandan çeşitli kararları çözmek için en iyi pratik düzenlemesini sağlayarak, (b) insanların içindeki çeşitli kararları tahmin etmek için otomatik metriklerden fazla a şırı çıktığını gösteriyoruz ve (c) farklılıkları kontrol etmek için kullanılan metodların çoğunlukla 'dekodin parametresi' şeklinde etkilenmesini sağlayarak etkilendiğin Bizim çerçevemiz farklı çeşitli metrikleri anlamanı geliştirebilir. Bu yolda daha iyi NLG sistemlerine doğru bir adım geliştirebilir.", 'sq': "Megjithë interesin në rritje në modelet e gjenerimit natyror të gjuhës (NLG) që prodhojnë rezultate të ndryshme, aktualisht nuk ka metodë të parim për vlerësimin e diversitetit të një sistemi NLG. Në këtë punë, propozojmë një kuadër për vlerësimin e metrikave të diversitetit. Kuadri masa korrelacionin midis një metrike diversiteti të propozuar dhe një parametri diversiteti, një parametri i vetëm që kontrollon disa aspekte të diversitetit në tekstin e gjeneruar. For example, a diversity parameter might be a binary variable used to instruct crowdsourcing workers to generate text with either low or high content diversity.  Ne demonstrojmë dobinë e kuadrit tonë duke: (a) vendosur praktikat më të mira për të krijuar gjykime të diversitetit nga njerëzit, (b) tregojmë se njerëzit kryesisht mbikalojnë metrikat automatike në vlerësimin e diversitetit të përmbajtjes dhe (c) demonstrojmë se metodat ekzistuese për kontrollin e diversitetit duke rregulluar një 'parametrë dekodimi' ndikojnë kryesisht në form ë por jo në kuptim. Korniza jonë mund të përparojë kuptimin e metrikave të ndryshme të diversitetit, një hap thelbësor në rrugën drejt sistemeve më të mira NLG.", 'af': "Terwyl gegroei belang in natuurlike taal generasie (NLG) modele wat verskeie uitvoerings produseer, is daar huidiglik geen vorderde metode om die verskeidigheid van 'n NLG stelsel te evalueer nie. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n raamwerk vir die evaluering van verskeidenheid metries. Die raamwerk maak die korrelasie tussen 'n voorgestelde verskeidigheid metriek en 'n verskeidigheid parameter, 'n enkele parameter wat kontroleer sommige aspek van verskeidigheid in genereerde teks. Byvoorbeeld, 'n verskeidigheid parameter dalk mag 'n binêre veranderlike wees wat gebruik word om verskeidigheid werkers te instrukteer om teks te genereer met óf lae of hoë inhoud verskeidigheid te genereer. Ons wys die nutsprogram van ons raamwerk deur: (a) die bestaan van beste praksies vir verwysing van verskeidenheid oordelings van mense, (b) wat mense substantieel outvoer automatiese metries in die estimatie van inhoud verskeidenheid, en (c) wat bevestig dat bestaande metodes vir beheer van verskeidenheid deur 'n 'dekoding parameter' meeste effektief op vorm maar nie beteken nie. Ons raamwerk kan die verstanding van verskillende verskillende metries voorspoedig, 'n nuwe stap op die pad na beter NLG stelsels.", 'bn': 'Despite growing interest in natural language generation (NLG) models that produce diverse outputs, there is currently no principled method for evaluating the diversity of an NLG system.  এই কাজে আমরা বৈচিত্র্যের মেট্রিক মূল্যায়নের জন্য একটি ফ্রেম কার্যক্রম প্রস্তাব করি। প্রস্তাবিত বৈচিত্র্যময় মেট্রিক এবং বৈচিত্র্যময় প্যারামিটারের মধ্যে সম্পর্ক নিয়ন্ত্রণ করে, একটি প্যারামিটার যা তৈরি করা লেখার উদাহরণস্বরূপ, একটি বৈচিত্র্যের প্যারামিটার হতে পারে বাইনারি ভেরিয়েল যাতে ব্যবহৃত গণসোর্সিং শ্রমিকদের শিক্ষা দেয়া হয়ে আমরা আমাদের ফ্রেমের ব্যবহার প্রদর্শন করি: (a) মানুষের বৈচার্যের বিভিন্ন বিচার উৎপাদনের জন্য সেরা প্রক্রিয়া প্রদর্শন করা, (b) যেখানে দেখাচ্ছে যে মানুষ স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে বৈচিত্র্যভাবে বৈচিত্র্যময় আমাদের ফ্রেমের কাঠামো বিভিন্ন বৈচিত্র্যমগুলোর বুঝতে পারে, যা এনএলজি সিস্টেমের দিকে যাওয়ার একটি গুরুত্ব', 'hy': 'Չնայած բնական լեզվի ստեղծման (ՆԼԳ) մոդելների աճող հետաքրքրություններին, որոնք արտադրում են բազմազան արդյունքներ, ներկայումս գոյություն չունի ՆԼԳ համակարգի բազմազանության գնահատման հիմնական մեթոդ: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք բազմազանության չափսերի գնահատման հիմք: Համակարգը չափում է հարաբերությունը առաջարկված բազմազանության մետրական և բազմազանության պարամետերի միջև, մի միակ պարամետր, որը վերահսկում է բազմազանության որոշ ասպեկտները ստեղծված տեքստում: Օրինակ, բազմազանության պարամետրոսը կարող է լինել երկարային փոփոխական, որը օգտագործվում է ժողովրդավար աշխատակիցներին սովորեցնելու համար ստեղծել տեքստ ցածր կամ բարձր պարունակության բազմազանությամբ: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս մեր կառուցվածքի օգտակարությունը: a) լավագույն գործողություններ ստեղծելով մարդկանց կողմից բազմազանության դատողություններ ստանալու համար, b) ցույց տալով, որ մարդիկ հիմնականում գերազանցում են ավտոմատիկ մետրիկները պարունակության բազմազանության գնահատման մեջ, և c) ցույց տալով, որ բազմազանության վերահսկման Մեր շրջանակը կարող է զարգացնել տարբեր բազմազանության չափումների հասկացությունը, որը կարևոր քայլ է ճանապարհին ավելի լավ ՆԼԳ համակարգերի ուղղությամբ:', 'az': "Təbiətli dil nəzəriyyəti (NLG) modellərinin çoxluğuna baxmayaraq, NLG sisteminin müxtəlifliyini değerləşdirmək üçün əslində başqa bir metodu yoxdur. Bu işdə, müxtəlif metrikləri değerləşdirmək üçün bir çerçivi təklif edirik. Çerçive təklif edilmiş müxtəlif metrik və müxtəlif parametr arasındakı bağlılığı ölçülür, təklif parametr, yaratdığı mətndə bəzi müxtəlif aspektlərini kontrol edir. Misal olaraq, müxtəlif parametr düşük və ya yüksək məlumat müxtəlifliyi ilə məktub yaratmaq üçün istifadə edilən iki dəyişiklik olar. Biz çerçəyimizin istifadəsini göstəririk: a) insanlardan müxtəlif hökmləri təhsil etmək üçün ən yaxşı praksi qurmaq, b) insanların müxtəlif müxtəlif məlumatları hesablamaq üçün automatik metriklərdən çox üstün olduğunu göstərir və c) müxtəlif təhsil etmək üçün müxtəlif metodları təhsil etmək üçün daha çox 'decoding parametrü' formu təşkil edir, lakin anlamına gəlməz. Bizim qurğumuz fərqli müxtəlif metriklərin anlaşılmasını, NLG sistemlərinin daha yaxşı yola yönəltməsi üçün əsas adım olar.", 'bs': 'Uprkos rastućem interesu u modele generacije prirodnog jezika (NLG) koji proizvode različite ishode, trenutno nema načelnog metoda za procjenu raznolikosti NLG-a. U ovom poslu predlažemo okvir za procjenu metrika raznolikosti. Okvir mjeri korelaciju između predloženog metričkog raznolikosti i parametra raznolikosti, jednog parametra koji kontrolira neke aspekte raznolikosti u proizvedenom tekstu. Na primjer, parameter raznolikosti bi mogao biti binarna varijabla koja se koristi kako bi uputila radnike iz crowdsourcing da stvore tekst sa niskom ili visokom raznolikošću sadržaja. Pokazujemo korisnost našeg okvira: a) utvrđivanje najboljih prakse za izbjegavanje osuđenja o raznolikosti od ljudi, b) pokazujući da ljudi značajno iznosi automatsku metriku u procjeni raznolikosti sadržaja, i c) pokazuju da postojeće metode kontrole raznolikosti prilagođavajući "parameter dekodiranja" uglavnom utječe na oblik, ali ne znači. Naš okvir može unaprijediti razumijevanje različitih metrika raznolikosti, osnovni korak na putu ka boljim NLG sustavima.', 'cs': 'Navzdory rostoucímu zájmu o modely generace přirozeného jazyka (NLG), které produkují různé výstupy, v současné době neexistuje zásadní metoda pro hodnocení diverzity NLG systému. V této práci navrhujeme rámec pro hodnocení metrik diverzity. Rámec měří korelaci mezi navrhovanou metrikou diverzity a parametrem diverzity, jedním parametrem, který řídí určitý aspekt diverzity v generovaném textu. Parametr diverzity může být například binární proměnná používaná k instrukci crowdsourcingových pracovníků, aby generovali text s nízkou nebo vysokou diverzitou obsahu. Užitečnost našeho rámce demonstrujeme tím, že: (a) stanovíme osvědčené postupy pro vyvolávání hodnocení diverzity od lidí, (b) ukážeme, že lidé podstatně překonávají automatické metriky při odhadu diverzity obsahu, a (c) ukážeme, že existující metody pro kontrolu diverzity laděním "dekódovacího parametru" většinou ovlivňují formu, ale nikoli význam. Náš rámec může pokročit pochopení různých metrik diverzity, což je zásadní krok na cestě k lepším systémům NLG.', 'ca': "Despite growing interest in natural language generation (NLG) models that produce diverse outputs, there is currently no principled method for evaluating the diversity of an NLG system.  En aquesta feina, proposem un marc per avaluar les mètriques de diversitat. El marc mesura la correlació entre un paràmetre de diversitat proposat i un paràmetre de diversitat, un únic paràmetre que controla algun aspecte de diversitat en el text generat. Per exemple, un paràmetre de diversitat podria ser una variable binaria utilitzada per ensenyar als treballadors de crowdsourcing a generar text amb baixa o alta diversitat de continguts. Demonstrem l'utilitat del nostre marc: a) establir les millors pràctiques per provocar judicis de diversitat dels humans, b) demostrar que els humans superen substancialment les mètriques automàtiques en l'estimació de la diversitat del contingut, i c) demostrar que els mètodes existents per controlar la diversitat ajustando un 'paràmetre de decodificació' afecten principalment la forma però no el sentit. El nostre marc pot avançar la comprensió de diferents mètriques de diversitat, un pas essencial en el camí cap a millors sistemes de LNL.", 'fi': "Huolimatta kasvavasta kiinnostuksesta eri tuotoksia tuottavia luonnollisen kielen generointimalleja kohtaan, tällä hetkellä ei ole olemassa periaatteellista menetelmää arvioida NLG-järjestelmän monimuotoisuutta. Tässä työssä ehdotamme viitekehystä monimuotoisuusmittarien arvioimiseksi. Kehys mittaa ehdotetun monimuotoisuusmittarin ja monimuotoisuusmittarin välistä korrelaatiota, joka on yksi parametri, joka ohjaa jonkin verran monimuotoisuutta luodussa tekstissä. Esimerkiksi monimuotoisuusparametri voi olla binäärimuuttuja, jota käytetään ohjaamaan joukkoistamisen työntekijöitä luomaan tekstiä, jossa on joko vähän tai paljon sisältöä. Osoitamme viitekehyksemme hyödyllisyyden: (a) luomalla parhaita käytäntöjä ihmisten monimuotoisuutta koskevien arviointien aikaansaamiseksi, (b) osoittamalla, että ihmiset suoriutuvat merkittävästi automaattisista mittareista sisällön monimuotoisuuden arvioinnissa, ja (c) osoittamalla, että olemassa olevat menetelmät monimuotoisuuden hallitsemiseksi säätämällä 'dekoodausparametria' vaikuttavat lähinnä muotoon mutta eivät merkitykseen. Kehyksemme voi edistää erilaisten monimuotoisuusmittarien ymmärtämistä, mikä on olennainen askel kohti parempia NLG-järjestelmiä.", 'am': 'የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ትውልድ (NLG) ሞዴላዎችን ሲያሳድጉ እንኳ ምንም እንኳ የNLG ስርዓት ልዩ ልዩ ልዩነት ማረጋገጥ የዋና ጥረት የለውም፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ የልዩ ልዩ ዓይነቶችን ለማሻሻል ፍሬም እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የሥርዓት ሥርዓት በተለየ ልዩ ልዩ ሚትሪክ እና በተለያዩ parameter መካከል ግንኙነትን ያስተካክላል፡፡ ለምሳሌ፣ የልዩ ልዩ ምርጫዎች ምናልባት የብዙsources ሠራተኞችን ጽሑፍ ወይም ከፍተኛ የሆኑትን ልዩ ልዩነት እንዲያስተምሩ የሚጠቀሙት የሁለት ልዩ ልዩ ልዩነት ይሆናል፡፡ (a) ከሰው የልዩ ልዩ ፍርድ ማቅረብ የሚደረግ ጥያቄዎችን ለማሳየት፣ (b) ሰውዎች የውይይት ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩነት እንዲያስተካክሉ እና (c) ለልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩነት ለመቆጣጠር የሚኖረውን ሥርዓት ማሳየት፣ ለብዙው ‘ቀድሞ parameter’ በጥያቄ ነገር ግን ማሰቃየት አይደለም፡፡ የሥርዓታችን የልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ሜትሪኮችን ማስተዋል ይችላል፣ በመንገድ ላይ ወደሚሻል የNLG ስርዓት መግለጫ የሚያስፈልጋል፡፡', 'et': 'Vaatamata kasvavale huvile looduskeele genereerimise mudelite vastu, mis toodavad erinevaid väljundeid, puudub praegu põhimõtteline meetod NLG süsteemi mitmekesisuse hindamiseks. Selles töös pakume välja raamistiku mitmekesisuse mõõdikute hindamiseks. Raamistik mõõdab seost kavandatud mitmekesisuse mõõdiku ja mitmekesisuse parameetri vahel, mis on üks parameeter, mis kontrollib mitmekesisuse mõningaid aspekte genereeritud tekstis. Näiteks võib mitmekesisuse parameeter olla binaarse muutuja, mida kasutatakse ühiskogumise töötajate õpetamiseks genereerida teksti kas väikese või suure sisulise mitmekesisusega. Näitame oma raamistiku kasulikkust järgmiselt: a) luues parimad tavad inimeste mitmekesisuse hindamiseks, b) näidates, et inimesed suudavad sisu mitmekesisuse hindamisel oluliselt ületada automaatseid mõõdikuid, ja c) näidates, et olemasolevad meetodid mitmekesisuse kontrollimiseks "dekodeerimisparameetri" häälestamise teel mõjutavad enamasti vormi, kuid mitte tähendust. Meie raamistik võib edendada erinevate mitmekesisuse mõõdikute mõistmist, mis on oluline samm teel paremate NLG süsteemide suunas.', 'jv': "Nanging kabèh pengguna sistem sing alih luwih nggawe alêr-luwih (NLG) model sing nganggep nggawe winih sing sampeyan, saiki ora ono sistem sing dipunangé kapan sistem NLG. Nang gawar iki, kita supoyata sistem kanggo nyelarakno kanggo nggawe barang-alam iki dadi. The frame measurements the coreletion amongst a proposal plural meter and a plural parameter, a single parameter that control some Aspect of Variance in generated text. sample Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing nyeasai ngéwé (a) iso ngêstahaan praksi sing luwih apik kanggo nggawe winih kanggo ngilanggar ngregani uwong, b) iso ngêstahan uwong kesempatan sistem sing berartik dhéwé, lan (c) iso ngêstahaan sistem kaya kedaulatan kanggo nyeasakno sistem sing berarti nggawe nggunakaé 'decoding parameter' supaya uwong ngêrbêt. Awak dhéwé iso nglanggar ngerasakno karo akeh sistem sing kalagayaan nggawe Metika, kuwi basa sing nyimpen kanggo awak dhéwé kuwi sistem NLG luwih apik.", 'sk': 'Kljub naraščajočemu zanimanju za modele generacije naravnega jezika (NLG), ki proizvajajo različne rezultate, trenutno ni načelne metode za ocenjevanje raznolikosti sistema NLG. V tem delu predlagamo okvir za ocenjevanje meritev raznolikosti. Okvir meri korelacijo med predlagano metriko raznolikosti in parametrom raznolikosti, ki je en sam parameter, ki nadzoruje nek vidik raznolikosti v ustvarjenem besedilu. Parameter raznolikosti je lahko na primer binarna spremenljivka, ki se uporablja za poučevanje delavcev množičnega izvora, da ustvarijo besedilo z nizko ali visoko raznolikostjo vsebine. Uporabnost našega okvira dokazujemo tako, da: (a) vzpostavimo najboljše prakse za izvajanje presoj o raznolikosti od ljudi, (b) pokažemo, da ljudje bistveno presegajo avtomatske meritve pri ocenjevanju raznolikosti vsebin, in (c) pokažemo, da obstoječe metode za nadzor raznolikosti z nastavitvijo "parametra dekodiranja" večinoma vplivajo na obliko, ne pa na pomen. Naš okvir lahko napreduje razumevanje različnih meril raznolikosti, kar je bistven korak na poti k boljšim sistemom NLG.', 'he': 'למרות עניין גדול בדוגמנים של דו"ח שפה טבעית (NLG) שיוצרים מגוונים, אין כרגע שום שיטה עקרונית להערכה את מגוון מערכת NLG. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים מסגרת להערכה מטריות מגוון. המסגרת ממדידה את הקשר בין מטריקת מגוון מוצעת ופרמטריקת מגוון, פרמטריקת אחת ששולטת באפקט מסוים של מגוון בטקסט יוצר. לדוגמא, פרמטר מגוון יכול להיות משתנה בינרית שמשתמשת כדי להדריך עובדי משאבי קהל ליצור טקסט עם מגוון תוכן נמוך או גבוה. אנו מוכיחים את היעילות של המסגרת שלנו על ידי: (a) הקמת מעשיות טובות לגרום שיפוטים מגוונים מהבני אדם, (b) להראות שבני אדם מבצעים במידה משמעותית מטריקה אוטומטית בערכת הערכה של מגוון תוכן, וכך (c) להוכיח ששיטות קיימות לשליטה בגוון על ידי הציון של "פרמטר פיצוי" משפיעים בעיקר על צור המסגרת שלנו יכולה לקדם את ההבנה של מטריות מגוון שונות, צעד חיוני בדרך לכיוון מערכות NLG טובות יותר.', 'bo': "སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་ལྟ་བ་དག་ལ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྷན་དུ་ཡིན་ནའང་མ་འདུག NLG་ལག་གི་སྣ་ཚོགས འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཚད་རྩིས་གཏོང་དང་། The framework measures the correlation between a proposed diversity metric and a diversity parameter, a single parameter that controls some aspect of diversity in generated text. For example, a diversity parameter might be a binary variable used to instruct crowdsourcing workers to generate text with either low or high content diversity. We demonstrate the utility of our framework by: (a) establishing best practices for eliciting diversity judgments from humans, (b) showing that humans substantially outperform automatic metrics in estimating content diversity, and (c) demonstrating that existing methods for controlling diversity by tuning a 'decoding parameter' mostly affect form but not meaning. ང་ཚོའི་གཞུང་གཞི་གིས་སྔར་མ་འདྲ་བའི་ཚད་རིམ་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ལྟར་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ཐུབ། NLG་མ་ལག་གི་ཁ", 'ha': "Babu da ƙarawa da interesse wa zaɓen wata na lugha na asili (NLG) motsi wanda ke fitar masu buƙata, ko da yanzu, ba za'a buƙata alƙaluman ƙididdige wa tsarin wata NLG. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buƙata wani firam dõmin ka evaluate mitori masu yawa. Firam yana ƙunsa da mazaunin tsakanin da aka buƙata fatauci mai yawa da wata parameter, da wata parameter guda wanda ke tsare wani aspecti na dabam'a cikin matsayin da aka ƙãga. Misali, wani parameter dabam-dabam, mai yiwuwa ya kasance wata variable na biyu wanda za'a yi amfani da wa'anar aikin mutsouri da za'a ƙiƙira matsayin da ko kuma don ya sami da buƙata masu ƙaranci. Mun nuna amfani da firam game da shi: (a) ka sami mafiya kyakkyawan hanyõyi ga elimi masu buƙata daga mutane, (b) Yana nũna wa mutane, a cikin ƙidãya ana ƙara metric farat ɗaya cikin ƙidãya masu motsi, kuma (c) ya nuna cewa kuna da hanyõyin da za'a kange multi-dabam da a tunkuɗe 'parameter koda' yana yi amfani da shi, amma b ã da amfani ba. Firmamiyarmu na iya ƙara fahimta ga metrici masu dabam-dabam, wata na muhimu a kan hanya zuwa ga mafiya alhẽri na'urar NLG."}
{'en': 'Retrieval, Re-ranking and Multi-task Learning for Knowledge-Base Question Answering', 'ar': 'الاسترجاع وإعادة الترتيب والتعلم متعدد المهام للإجابة على أسئلة قاعدة المعارف', 'fr': 'Récupération, reclassement et apprentissage multitâche pour la réponse aux questions de la base de connaissances', 'pt': 'Recuperação, Reclassificação e Aprendizado Multitarefa para Resposta a Perguntas da Base de Conhecimento', 'es': 'Recuperación, reclasificación y aprendizaje multitarea para la respuesta a preguntas de la base de conocimientos', 'zh': '检索、重序、多任务学,施于知识库问答', 'ja': 'ナレッジベースの質問に対する回答の検索、再ランク付け、マルチタスク学習', 'ru': 'Извлечение, перераспределение и многозадачное обучение для ответа на вопросы на основе знаний', 'hi': 'पुनर्प्राप्ति, पुन: रैंकिंग और बहु-कार्य ज्ञान के लिए सीखना-आधार प्रश्न उत्तर', 'ga': 'Aisghabháil, Athrangú agus Foghlaim Ilthasc le haghaidh Freagra ar Cheisteanna ar Bhonn Eolais', 'ka': 'კონფიგურაცია, განვითარება და მრავალ დავალების სწავლება', 'el': 'Ανάκτηση, επανακατάταξη και εκμάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών για την απάντηση ερωτήσεων στη Γνώση-Βάση', 'hu': 'Visszaszerzés, átrendezés és többfeladatos tanulás a tudásbázis kérdések megválaszolásához', 'lt': 'Retrieval, Re-ranking and Multi-task Learning for Knowledge-Base Question Answering', 'kk': 'Білім- негізгі сұрақ жауап беру үшін қайта реттеу және көптеген тапсырмаларды оқыту', 'mk': 'Retrieval, Re-ranking and Multi-task Learning for Knowledge-Base Question Answering', 'it': 'Recupero, riorientamento e apprendimento multi-task per la risposta alle domande della Knowledge Base', 'ml': 'അറിവ്- അടിസ്ഥാനത്തെ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'ms': 'Retrieval, Re-ranking and Multi-task Learning for Knowledge-Base Question Answering', 'mn': 'Харин мэдлэг-үндсэн асуулт хариултын тулд олон ажил суралцах, дахин зарцуулах, олон ажил суралцах', 'mt': 'Il-kisba, il-klassifikazzjoni mill-ġdid u t-Tagħlim Multikompitu għat-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet ibbażati fuq l-għarfien', 'ro': 'Recuperarea, re-clasificarea și învățarea cu mai multe sarcini pentru răspunsul la întrebările bazei de cunoștințe', 'no': 'Hent, reintegring og fleire oppgåver læring for kunnskapsbasespørsmål', 'pl': 'Odzyskiwanie, zmiana rankingu i wielozadaniowe uczenie się dla odpowiedzi na pytania bazy wiedzy', 'si': 'දැනගන්න, ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරය සහ ගොඩක් වැඩි වැඩි කාර්ය ඉගෙනීම', 'sr': 'Odgovor na pitanja na osnovu znanja, ponovno raspoređivanje i više zadataka', 'sv': 'Hämta, omräkna och multi-task lärande för kunskapsbassvar', 'ur': 'علم-Base سوال کی جواب کے لئے پھیر لینے، دوبارہ رقم لینے اور بہت سے کام کی تعلیم', 'so': 'Furasho, dib u raadinta iyo waxbarashada waxbarashada aqoonta aasaasiga ah', 'ta': 'அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படை கேள்வியின் பதில்', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Trả lời câu hỏi về thu hồi, tái cấp bậc và nhiều nhiệm vụ.', 'bg': 'Извличане, повторно класиране и обучение с множество задачи за отговор на въпроси от базата от знания', 'nl': 'Retrieval, Re-ranking en Multi-task Learning voor het beantwoorden van vragen in de kennisbank', 'hr': 'Povlačenje, ponovno postavljanje i učenje višezadataka za odgovor na pitanja na temelju znanja', 'id': 'Penerimaan, Rangkaian ulang dan Pelajaran Multi-Tugas untuk Jawaban Pertanyaan Berdasarkan Pengetahuan', 'de': 'Retrieval, Re-Ranking und Multi-Task Learning für die Beantwortung von Fragen in der Wissensdatenbank', 'ko': '지식 라이브러리 문답 검색, 재배열 및 다중 임무 학습', 'da': 'Hentning, genrangering og multi-opgave læring til besvarelse af vidensbaserede spørgsmål', 'sw': 'Kurejesha, Kurejea tena na Kufunza kazi nyingi kwa ajili ya swali la msingi la Ujuzi', 'sq': 'Rregjistrimi, Rirenditja dhe Mësimi me shumë detyra për përgjigjet e pyetjeve të bazuara në njohuri', 'hy': 'Գիտության հիմնված հարցերի պատասխանի վերադարձում, վերադասավորում և բազմահապատասխանում սովորելու համար', 'af': 'Herhaal, herranking en meer-taak leer vir kennis-basis vraag antwoord', 'az': 'Bilim-Base sual cavabı üçün geri alın, yenidən dərəcəli və çox-iş öyrənmək', 'ca': 'Recuperació, reclassificació i aprenentatge multitascat per respondre a preguntes basades en el coneixement', 'tr': 'Elm-Base Soragy jogap üçin ýene synçy, ýene synçy we köp-zady öwrenmek', 'fa': 'بازیابی، پاسخ دادن سوال\u200cهای زیر علم و دانش', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bs': 'Povlačenje, ponovno raspoređenje i učenje više zadataka za odgovor na pitanja na bazi znanja', 'et': 'Teabebaasi küsimustele vastamiseks mõeldud kogumine, ümberhindamine ja mitme ülesandega õppimine', 'fi': 'Nouto, uudelleensijoitus ja monitehtäväoppiminen Knowledge Base -kyselyihin vastaamista varten', 'bn': 'জ্ঞান-ভিত্তিক প্রশ্নের উত্তর', 'cs': 'Vyhledávání, přehodnocení a víceúkolové učení pro zodpovězení otázek znalostní báze', 'jv': 'Ndeleng, Re-ranging lan Multi-task Fjering kanggo Kearno-Bas Pangunian Inggal Jabun', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'sk': 'Pridobivanje, ponovno razvrščanje in večopravilno učenje za odgovarjanje na vprašanja iz zbirke znanja', 'he': 'קיבלת, מחדש את הדרגה והלימוד במשימות רבות לענות על שאלות מבוססת ידע', 'bo': 'སླར་གསོ་སྐབས་དང་། སྐྱར་དུ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་དང་སྣ་མང་བོའི་གནས་ཚུལ་སྤྲོ་སྟངས་ལ་བསྐྱར་དུ་འཇུག་པ།'}
{'en': 'Question answering over knowledge bases (KBQA) usually involves three sub-tasks, namely topic entity detection, entity linking and relation detection. Due to the large number of entities and relations inside knowledge bases (KB), previous work usually utilized sophisticated rules to narrow down the search space and managed only a subset of KBs in memory. In this work, we leverage a retrieve-and-rerank framework to access KBs via traditional information retrieval (IR) method, and re-rank retrieved candidates with more powerful neural networks such as the pre-trained BERT model. Considering the fact that directly assigning a different BERT model for each sub-task may incur prohibitive costs, we propose to share a BERT encoder across all three sub-tasks and define task-specific layers on top of the shared layer. The unified model is then trained under a multi-task learning framework. Experiments show that : (1) Our IR-based retrieval method is able to collect high-quality candidates efficiently, thus enables our method adapt to large-scale KBs easily ; (2) the BERT model improves the accuracy across all three sub-tasks ; and (3) benefiting from multi-task learning, the unified model obtains further improvements with only 1/3 of the original parameters. Our final model achieves competitive results on the SimpleQuestions dataset and superior performance on the FreebaseQA dataset.retrieve-and-rerank framework to access KBs via traditional information retrieval (IR) method, and re-rank retrieved candidates with more powerful neural networks such as the pre-trained BERT model. Considering the fact that directly assigning a different BERT model for each sub-task may incur prohibitive costs, we propose to share a BERT encoder across all three sub-tasks and define task-specific layers on top of the shared layer. The unified model is then trained under a multi-task learning framework. Experiments show that: (1) Our IR-based retrieval method is able to collect high-quality candidates efficiently, thus enables our method adapt to large-scale KBs easily; (2) the BERT model improves the accuracy across all three sub-tasks; and (3) benefiting from multi-task learning, the unified model obtains further improvements with only 1/3 of the original parameters. Our final model achieves competitive results on the SimpleQuestions dataset and superior performance on the FreebaseQA dataset.', 'ar': 'عادةً ما تتضمن الإجابة على الأسئلة حول قواعد المعرفة (KBQA) ثلاث مهام فرعية ، وهي اكتشاف كيان الموضوع ، وربط الكيانات واكتشاف العلاقة. نظرًا للعدد الكبير من الكيانات والعلاقات داخل قواعد المعرفة (KB) ، استخدم العمل السابق عادةً قواعد معقدة لتضييق مساحة البحث وإدارة مجموعة فرعية فقط من KBs في الذاكرة. في هذا العمل ، نستفيد من إطار عمل استرداد وإعادة ترتيب للوصول إلى KBs عبر طريقة استرجاع المعلومات التقليدية (IR) ، وإعادة ترتيب المرشحين المسترجعين بشبكات عصبية أكثر قوة مثل نموذج BERT المدرب مسبقًا. بالنظر إلى حقيقة أن التعيين المباشر لنموذج BERT مختلف لكل مهمة فرعية قد يؤدي إلى تكاليف باهظة ، فإننا نقترح مشاركة مشفر BERT عبر المهام الفرعية الثلاث وتحديد الطبقات الخاصة بالمهمة أعلى الطبقة المشتركة. ثم يتم تدريب النموذج الموحد ضمن إطار عمل تعليمي متعدد المهام. تظهر التجارب أن: (1) طريقة الاسترجاع المعتمدة على IR لدينا قادرة على جمع مرشحين ذوي جودة عالية بكفاءة ، وبالتالي تمكن طريقتنا من التكيف مع KBs واسعة النطاق بسهولة ؛ (2) يعمل نموذج BERT على تحسين الدقة في جميع المهام الفرعية الثلاث ؛ و (3) الاستفادة من التعلم متعدد المهام ، ويحصل النموذج الموحد على مزيد من التحسينات مع 1/3 فقط من المعلمات الأصلية. يحقق نموذجنا النهائي نتائج تنافسية على مجموعة بيانات SimpleQuestions وأداءً فائقًا على مجموعة بيانات FreebaseQA.', 'pt': 'A resposta a perguntas sobre bases de conhecimento (KBQA) geralmente envolve três subtarefas, a saber, detecção de entidade de tópico, vinculação de entidade e detecção de relação. Devido ao grande número de entidades e relações dentro de bases de conhecimento (KBs), trabalhos anteriores geralmente utilizavam regras sofisticadas para restringir o espaço de busca e gerenciavam apenas um subconjunto de KBs na memória. Neste trabalho, aproveitamos uma estrutura de recuperação e reclassificação para acessar KBs por meio do método tradicional de recuperação de informações (IR) e reclassificamos candidatos recuperados com redes neurais mais poderosas, como o modelo BERT pré-treinado. Considerando o fato de que atribuir diretamente um modelo BERT diferente para cada subtarefa pode incorrer em custos proibitivos, propomos compartilhar um codificador BERT em todas as três subtarefas e definir camadas específicas de tarefas no topo da camada compartilhada. O modelo unificado é então treinado em uma estrutura de aprendizado multitarefa. Experimentos mostram que: (1) Nosso método de recuperação baseado em IR é capaz de coletar candidatos de alta qualidade com eficiência, permitindo assim que nosso método se adapte facilmente a KBs de grande escala; (2) o modelo BERT melhora a precisão em todas as três subtarefas; e (3) beneficiando-se do aprendizado multitarefa, o modelo unificado obtém melhorias adicionais com apenas 1/3 dos parâmetros originais. Nosso modelo final alcança resultados competitivos no conjunto de dados SimpleQuestions e desempenho superior no conjunto de dados FreebaseQA.', 'es': 'La respuesta a preguntas a través de bases de conocimientos (KBQA) generalmente implica tres subtareas, a saber, detección de entidades temáticas, vinculación de entidades y detección de relaciones Debido a la gran cantidad de entidades y relaciones dentro de las bases de conocimiento (KB), el trabajo anterior solía utilizar reglas sofisticadas para reducir el espacio de búsqueda y administraba solo un subconjunto de KB en la memoria. En este trabajo, aprovechamos un marco de recuperación y clasificación para acceder a los KB a través del método tradicional de recuperación de información (IR), y reorganizamos los candidatos recuperados con redes neuronales más potentes, como el modelo BERT previamente entrenado. Teniendo en cuenta el hecho de que la asignación directa de un modelo BERT diferente para cada subtarea puede generar costos prohibitivos, proponemos compartir un codificador BERT en las tres subtareas y definir capas específicas de la tarea en la parte superior de la capa compartida. El modelo unificado se entrena luego en un marco de aprendizaje multitarea. Los experimentos muestran que: (1) Nuestro método de recuperación basado en IR es capaz de recopilar candidatos de alta calidad de manera eficiente, lo que permite que nuestro método se adapte fácilmente a KB a gran escala; (2) el modelo BERT mejora la precisión en las tres subtareas; y (3) el modelo unificado se beneficia del aprendizaje multitarea mejoras adicionales con solo 1/3 de los parámetros originales. Nuestro modelo final logra resultados competitivos en el conjunto de datos SimpleQuestions y un rendimiento superior en el conjunto de datos de FreeBaseQA.', 'fr': "La réponse aux questions sur les bases de connaissances (KBQA) implique généralement trois sous-tâches, à savoir la détection d'entités de sujets, la liaison d'entités et la détection de relations. En raison du grand nombre d'entités et de relations dans les bases de connaissances (KB), les travaux précédents utilisaient généralement des règles sophistiquées pour réduire l'espace de recherche et ne géraient qu'un sous-ensemble de KB en mémoire. Dans ce travail, nous exploitons un cadre de récupération et de classement pour accéder aux KB via la méthode traditionnelle de récupération d'informations (IR), et reclassons les candidats récupérés avec des réseaux de neurones plus puissants tels que le modèle BERT pré-entraîné. Étant donné que l'attribution directe d'un modèle BERT différent pour chaque sous-tâche peut entraîner des coûts prohibitifs, nous proposons de partager un encodeur BERT pour les trois sous-tâches et de définir des couches spécifiques aux tâches au-dessus de la couche partagée. Le modèle unifié est ensuite entraîné dans un cadre d'apprentissage multitâche. Les expériences montrent que\xa0: (1) notre méthode de récupération basée sur l'IR est capable de collecter efficacement des candidats de haute qualité, ce qui permet à notre méthode de s'adapter facilement aux bases de connaissances à grande échelle\xa0; (2) le modèle BERT améliore la précision des trois sous-tâches\xa0; et (3) bénéficiant de l'apprentissage multitâche, le modèle unifié obtient d'autres améliorations avec seulement 1/3 des paramètres d'origine. Notre modèle final obtient des résultats compétitifs sur le jeu de données SimpleQuestions et des performances supérieures sur le jeu de données FreeBaseQA.", 'ja': 'ナレッジベース（ KBQA ）を介した質問の回答には、通常、トピックエンティティ検出、エンティティリンク、リレーションシップ検出の3つのサブタスクが含まれます。 多数のエンティティとナレッジベース内のリレーションシップ（ KB ）のため、以前の作業では通常、洗練されたルールを使用して検索スペースを絞り込み、メモリ内のKBのサブセットのみを管理していました。 この研究では、検索とランク付けのフレームワークを活用して、従来の情報検索（ IR ）方法を介してKBにアクセスし、事前に訓練されたBERTモデルのようなより強力なニューラルネットワークで検索された候補を再ランク付けします。 サブタスクごとに異なるBERTモデルを直接割り当てると、膨大なコストが発生する可能性があることを考慮して、3つのサブタスクすべてにわたってBERTエンコーダを共有し、共有レイヤーの上にタスク固有のレイヤーを定義することを提案します。 統一されたモデルは、マルチタスク学習フレームワークの下でトレーニングされます。 実験によると、(1)当社のIRベースの検索方法は、高品質の候補を効率的に収集することができるため、当社の方法が大規模なKBに簡単に適応できること、(2) BERTモデルは、3つのサブタスクすべてにわたって精度を向上させること、および(3)マルチタスク学習の恩恵を受けて、統合されたモデルは、元のパラメータのわずか1/3でさらなる改善を得ることができます。 当社の最終モデルは、SimpleQuestionsデータセットで競争力のある結果を達成し、FreebaseQAデータセットで優れたパフォーマンスを実現します。', 'hi': 'नॉलेज बेस (KBQA) पर प्रश्न का उत्तर देने में आमतौर पर तीन उप-कार्य शामिल होते हैं, अर्थात् विषय इकाई का पता लगाना, एंटिटी लिंकिंग और संबंध का पता लगाना। नॉलेज बेस (KB) के अंदर बड़ी संख्या में संस्थाओं और संबंधों के कारण, पिछले काम ने आमतौर पर खोज स्थान को संकीर्ण करने के लिए परिष्कृत नियमों का उपयोग किया और स्मृति में KBs का केवल एक सबसेट प्रबंधित किया। इस काम में, हम पारंपरिक सूचना पुनर्प्राप्ति (आईआर) विधि के माध्यम से केबी तक पहुंचने के लिए एक पुनर्प्राप्त-और-रीरैंक ढांचे का लाभ उठाते हैं, और पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित BERT मॉडल जैसे अधिक शक्तिशाली तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के साथ पुनर्प्राप्त उम्मीदवारों को फिर से रैंक करते हैं। इस तथ्य को ध्यान में रखते हुए कि प्रत्येक उप-कार्य के लिए सीधे एक अलग BERT मॉडल असाइन करने से निषेधात्मक लागत हो सकती है, हम सभी तीन उप-कार्यों में BERT एन्कोडर साझा करने और साझा परत के शीर्ष पर कार्य-विशिष्ट परतों को परिभाषित करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। एकीकृत मॉडल को तब एक बहु-कार्य सीखने के ढांचे के तहत प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि: (1) हमारी आईआर-आधारित पुनर्प्राप्ति विधि उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले उम्मीदवारों को कुशलतापूर्वक एकत्र करने में सक्षम है, इस प्रकार हमारी विधि आसानी से बड़े पैमाने पर केबी के अनुकूल होने में सक्षम बनाती है; (2) BERT मॉडल सभी तीन उप-कार्यों में सटीकता में सुधार करता है; और (3) बहु-कार्य सीखने से लाभान्वित होकर, एकीकृत मॉडल मूल मापदंडों के केवल 1/3 के साथ और सुधार प्राप्त करता है। हमारा अंतिम मॉडल SimpleQuestions डेटासेट पर प्रतिस्पर्धी परिणाम और FreebaseQA डेटासेट पर बेहतर प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है।', 'zh': '知识库问答 (KBQA) 常及三子,曰主题实体检测、实体链接检。 以知识库 (KB) 内多实体,前事常以杂法缩小搜索空间,而但管内存中一 KB。 于是检索重列框架访问旧信息检索(IR)KB,强大之神经网络(,预为BERT形)重为检索到候选者。 念子事分异BERT或生高本,请于三子之间共一BERT编码器,定义特定于共享之顶。 然后教习于多任务框架下。 实验曰:(1)吾IR之检,可以收高质量之选,而使吾道可以轻适大KB。 (2)BERT范增三子之准确性。 (3)益多任务学,一模则以始参数者1/3更进之。 终于 SimpleQuestions 数集上致有竞争力,FreebaseQA 数集上成卓异。', 'ru': 'Ответы на вопросы по базам знаний (KBQA) обычно включают в себя три подзадачи, а именно: обнаружение тематической сущности, связывание сущности и обнаружение связи. Из-за большого количества сущностей и отношений внутри баз знаний (КБ) в предыдущей работе обычно использовались сложные правила для сужения пространства поиска и управлялись только подмножеством КБ в памяти. В этой работе мы используем фреймворк извлечения и повторного ранжирования для доступа к КБ с помощью традиционного метода извлечения информации (IR) и повторно ранжируем извлеченных кандидатов с более мощными нейронными сетями, такими как предварительно обученная модель BERT. Учитывая тот факт, что прямое назначение другой модели BERT для каждой подзадачи может повлечь за собой непомерные затраты, мы предлагаем использовать общий кодер BERT для всех трех подзадач и определить специфические для задачи слои поверх общего слоя. Затем унифицированная модель обучается в рамках многозадачного обучения. Эксперименты показывают, что: (1) наш метод поиска на основе ИК способен эффективно собирать высококачественных кандидатов, таким образом, позволяет нашему методу легко адаптироваться к крупномасштабным КБ; (2) модель BERT улучшает точность по всем трем подзадачам; и (3) благодаря многозадачному обучению унифицированная модель получает дальнейшие улучшения только с 1/3 исходных параметров. Наша окончательная модель достигает конкурентных результатов в наборе данных SimpleQuestions и превосходной производительности в наборе данных FreebaseQA.', 'ga': 'Is gnách go mbíonn trí fhothasc i gceist le ceisteanna a fhreagairt thar bhunachar eolais (KBQA), is iad sin braite aonán topaice, nascadh aonáin agus aimsiú gaol. Mar gheall ar an líon mór eintiteas agus caidreamh taobh istigh de bhunachar eolais (KB), bhain obair roimhe seo úsáid as rialacha sofaisticiúla de ghnáth chun an spás cuardaigh a laghdú agus níor bhainistíodh ach fo-thacar de KBanna sa chuimhne. San obair seo, déanaimid giaráil ar chreat aisghabhála-agus-athrangaithe chun rochtain a fháil ar KBanna trí mhodh traidisiúnta aisghabhála faisnéise (IR), agus déanaimid athrangú ar iarrthóirí aisghabhála le líonraí néaracha níos cumhachtaí, mar shampla an tsamhail BERT réamh-oilte. Ag cur san áireamh go bhféadfadh costais choisctheacha a bheith i gceist le múnla difriúil CRET a shannadh go díreach do gach fothasc, tá sé beartaithe againn ionchódóir CRET a roinnt ar fud na dtrí fhothasc agus sraitheanna tasc-shonracha a shainiú ar bharr na sraithe comhroinnte. Cuirtear oiliúint ar an tsamhail aontaithe ansin faoi chreat foghlama il-tasc. Léiríonn turgnaimh: (1) Is é ár modh aisghabhála IR-bhunaithe in ann iarrthóirí ardcháilíochta a bhailiú go héifeachtach, rud a chuireann ar chumas ár modh a oiriúnú do KBanna ar scála mór go héasca; (2) feabhsaíonn múnla BERT an cruinneas ar fud na dtrí fhothasc; agus (3) ag baint leasa as foghlaim ilthascanna, faigheann an tsamhail aontaithe tuilleadh feabhsuithe agus gan ach 1/3 de na paraiméadair bhunaidh. Baineann ár múnla deiridh torthaí iomaíocha amach ar thacar sonraí SimpleQuestions agus feidhmíocht níos fearr ar thacar sonraí FreebaseQA.', 'ka': 'Name მეცნიერების ბაზის (KB) შორის დიდი რაოდენობის შესახებ, წინა სამუშაოდ სამუშაოდ გამოყენებული სფექტიკური წესების გამოყენება, რომელიც ძიება სივრცე და მხოლოდ KB-ის სექსე ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ კოდინტაციური ინფორმაციის მიღება (IR) გამოყენებაზე კოდინტაციური ინფორმაციის მიღება და კოდინტაციის მიღება უფრო ძალიან ნეიროლური ქსელებით, როგორც პრეტაციური BERT მოდელის მიღ ამ ფაქტის შესახებ, რომ განსხვავებული BERT მოდელი ყოველ საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი ერთადერთი მოდელი შემდეგ მრავალური დასწავლების ფრამეტრების დამატებული იყო. ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენებს, რომ: (1) ჩვენი IR-ის დაბათებული მიღება შეუძლებელია მაღალი კანდიდეტები ეფექტიურად შეიყვანა, ამიტომ ჩვენი მეთოდის შესაძლებლობა დიდ კოლეტებში (2) BERT მოდელი ყველა სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო დამუშაობა; და (3) მრავალ დავალების სწავლებისგან გამოიყენება, ერთადერთებული მოდელი მიიღება უფრო მეტი დაახლოებით, რომლებიც მხოლოდ 1/3 ორიგინალური პარამეტრებით. ჩვენი საკუთარი მოდელეში კონპექციური შედეგები გავაკეთება საკუთარი კითხვების მონაცემების და საკუთარი მონაცემები FreebaseQA მონაცემების სეტში.', 'el': 'Η απάντηση στις ερωτήσεις μέσω βάσεων γνώσεων (KBQA) συνήθως περιλαμβάνει τρεις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες, δηλαδή την ανίχνευση θεματικών οντοτήτων, τη σύνδεση οντοτήτων και την ανίχνευση σχέσεων. Λόγω του μεγάλου αριθμού οντοτήτων και σχέσεων μέσα στις βάσεις γνώσης (ΚΒ), προηγούμενες εργασίες χρησιμοποιούσαν συνήθως εξελιγμένους κανόνες για να περιορίσουν το χώρο αναζήτησης και διαχειρίστηκαν μόνο ένα υποσύνολο ΚΒ στη μνήμη. Σε αυτή την εργασία, αξιοποιούμε ένα πλαίσιο ανάκτησης και επανακατάταξης για να αποκτήσουμε πρόσβαση σε KBs μέσω της παραδοσιακής μεθόδου ανάκτησης πληροφοριών (IR) και να επανακατατάξουμε τους ανακτημένους υποψηφίους με ισχυρότερα νευρωνικά δίκτυα όπως το προ-εκπαιδευμένο μοντέλο BERT. Λαμβάνοντας υπόψη το γεγονός ότι η άμεση ανάθεση ενός διαφορετικού μοντέλου για κάθε δευτερεύουσα εργασία μπορεί να προκαλέσει απαγορευτικά έξοδα, προτείνουμε να μοιραστούμε έναν κωδικοποιητή σε όλες τις τρεις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες και να ορίσουμε ειδικά επίπεδα εργασίας πάνω από το κοινόχρηστο στρώμα. Το ενοποιημένο μοντέλο εκπαιδεύεται στη συνέχεια κάτω από ένα μαθησιακό πλαίσιο πολλαπλών εργασιών. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι: (1) Η μέθοδος ανάκτησης με βάση τις υπέρυθρες ακτίνες είναι σε θέση να συλλέγει αποτελεσματικά υποψήφιους υψηλής ποιότητας, επιτρέποντας έτσι την εύκολη προσαρμογή της μεθόδου μας σε μεγάλες μονάδες. (2) το μοντέλο BERT βελτιώνει την ακρίβεια και στις τρεις επιμέρους εργασίες· και (3) επωφελούμενος από την εκμάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών, το ενοποιημένο μοντέλο αποκτά περαιτέρω βελτιώσεις με μόνο 1/3 από τις αρχικές παραμέτρους. Το τελικό μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει ανταγωνιστικά αποτελέσματα στο σύνολο δεδομένων και ανώτερη απόδοση στο σύνολο δεδομένων FreebaseQA.', 'hu': 'A tudásbázisokon keresztüli kérdések megválaszolása (KBQA) általában három alfeladatot foglal magában, nevezetesen a téma entitások észlelését, entitások összekapcsolását és kapcsolatok észlelését. A tudásbázisokon belüli entitások és kapcsolatok nagy számának köszönhetően a korábbi munkák általában kifinomult szabályokat használtak a keresési terület szűkítésére, és csak egy részhalmazt kezeltek a memóriában. Ebben a munkában egy visszahívási és újrakezdési keretrendszert használunk arra, hogy hagyományos információvisszahívási (IR) módszerrel elérjük a KBeket, és újra rangsoroljuk a visszahívott jelölteket erősebb neurális hálózatokkal, mint például az előképzett BERT modell. Tekintettel arra, hogy egy másik BERT-modell közvetlen hozzárendelése minden egyes alcsoporthoz korlátozott költségekkel járhat, javasoljuk, hogy mindhárom alcsoportban megosszunk egy BERT-kódolót, és a feladatspecifikus rétegeket határozzuk meg a megosztott réteg tetején. Az egységes modellt ezután egy többfeladatos tanulási keretrendszer keretében képezik. Kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy: (1) IR alapú visszakeresési módszerünk képes hatékonyan összegyűjteni a kiváló minőségű jelölteket, így módszerünk könnyen alkalmazkodik a nagyszabású KBhez; (2) a BERT modell mindhárom alcsoport pontosságát javítja; és (3) a többfeladatos tanulás előnyeit kihasználva az egységes modell további fejlesztéseket ér el az eredeti paraméterek mindössze 1/3-ával. A végső modellünk versenyképes eredményeket ér el a SimpleQuestions adatkészleten és kiváló teljesítményt a FreebaseQA adatkészleten.', 'kk': 'Білім негізінде (KBQA) сұрақ жауап беру әдетте үш ішкі тапсырмалар бар, мысалы, нақыштың нысандарын анықтау, нысандарды сілтемелеу мен қатынасын анықтау. Білім негізінің ішіндегі нысандар мен қатынастар көп саны (КБ) сияқты, алдыңғы жұмыс іздеу кеңістігін азайту үшін қолданылады жұмыс жады бойынша ғана КБ бағанын басқарылады. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, КБ-ге әдетті мәліметті алу (IR) әдісімен қатынау және қайта реттеу және қайта реттеу кандидаттарды көмектесетін неврал желілерімен, мысалы, BERT моделі ретінде қайта реттеу үшін қолданып, қа Әрбір ішкі тапсырма үшін басқа BERT үлгісін таңдау мүмкін емес бағаттар болуы мүмкін, біз BERT кодерін бүкіл үш ішкі тапсырмалардың ортақтастырылған қабаттардың үстінде ортақтастыру және тапсырманың ерекше қабаттарын анықта Біріктірілген үлгі бірнеше тапсырманың оқыту фреймінде оқылған. Тәжірибелер: (1) Біздің IR-негіздегі алу әдісіміз жоғары сапатты кандидаттарды ең жақсы жинақтауға мүмкіндік береді, сондықтан бұл әдісіміздің үлкен өлшемдеріне көмектесу (2) BERT үлгісі барлық үш ішкі тапсырмалардың дұрыстығын жақсартады; және (3) бірнеше тапсырмаларды оқытудан пайдалану үшін біріктірілген үлгі бастапқы параметрлердің тек 1/3 дегенмен бірнеше жақсартуларын алады. Біздің соңғы үлгіміз FreebaseQA деректер қорларындағы SimpleQuestion деректер қорларының және жоғары әрекеттерінің соңғы нәтижесін жеткізеді.', 'it': "La risposta alle domande sulle basi di conoscenza (KBQA) di solito comporta tre sottoattività, vale a dire il rilevamento di entità tematiche, il collegamento di entità e il rilevamento delle relazioni. A causa del gran numero di entità e relazioni all'interno delle knowledge base (KB), i lavori precedenti di solito utilizzavano regole sofisticate per restringere lo spazio di ricerca e gestivano solo un sottoinsieme di KB in memoria. In questo lavoro, sfruttiamo un framework di recupero e riallacciamento per accedere alle KB tramite il metodo tradizionale di recupero delle informazioni (IR), e ri-rankiamo i candidati recuperati con reti neurali più potenti come il modello BERT pre-addestrato. Considerando che l'assegnazione diretta di un modello BERT diverso per ogni sottoattività può comportare costi proibitivi, proponiamo di condividere un encoder BERT tra tutte e tre le sottoattività e definire livelli specifici per attività sopra il livello condiviso. Il modello unificato viene quindi formato nell'ambito di un framework di apprendimento multi-task. Gli esperimenti dimostrano che: (1) Il nostro metodo di recupero basato su IR è in grado di raccogliere candidati di alta qualità in modo efficiente, consentendo così al nostro metodo di adattarsi facilmente a KBs su larga scala; (2) il modello BERT migliora l'accuratezza di tutte e tre le attività secondarie; e (3) beneficiando dell'apprendimento multi-task, il modello unificato ottiene ulteriori miglioramenti con solo 1/3 dei parametri originali. Il nostro modello finale raggiunge risultati competitivi sul set di dati SimpleQuestions e prestazioni superiori sul set di dati FreebaseQA.", 'lt': 'Question answering over knowledge bases (KBQA) usually involves three sub-tasks, namely topic entity detection, entity linking and relation detection.  Dėl didelio subjektų skaičiaus ir santykių žinių bazėse (KB), ankstesniame darbe paprastai buvo naudojamos sudėtingos taisyklės paieškos erdvei sutrumpinti ir buvo valdomas tik KB pogrupis atmintinėje. Šiame darbe naudojame surinkimo ir pakartotinio ryšio sistemą, kad KB galėtų naudotis tradiciniu informacijos surinkimo (IR) metodu, ir perklasifikuojame surinktus kandidatus su stipresniais nerviniais tinklais, pavyzdžiui, iš anksto parengtu BERT modeliu. Atsižvelgdami į tai, kad tiesiogiai skirtingam BERT modeliui priskirti kiekvienam subuždaviniui gali atsirasti draudžiamų išlaidų, siūlome pasidalyti BERT kodatoriumi visomis trimis subuždavinėmis ir nustatyti uždaviniams būdingus sluoksnius virš bendro sluoksnio. Tuomet suvienodintas model is mokomas pagal daugiafunkcinio mokymosi sistemą. Eksperimentai rodo, kad: (1) Mūsų IR pagrįstas atkūrimo metodas gali veiksmingai rinkti aukštos kokybės kandidatus, todėl mūsų metodas gali lengvai prisitaikyti prie didelio masto KB; (2) the BERT model improves the accuracy across all three sub-tasks;  and (3) benefiting from multi-task learning, the unified model obtains further improvements with only 1/3 of the original parameters.  Mūsų galutinis modelis pasiekia konkurencinius rezultatus dėl paprastųjų klausimų duomenų rinkinio ir geresnių FreebaseQA duomenų rinkinio rezultatų.', 'mk': 'Одговорот на прашањата во врска со базите на знаење (КБКА) обично вклучува три подзадачи, а тоа детекција на темски ентитети, поврзување на ентитетите и детекција на врски. Поради големиот број ентитети и односи внатре во базите на знаење (КБ), претходната работа обично користеше софистицирани правила за намалување на просторот за пребарување и управуваше со само подгрупа КБ во меморијата. Во оваа работа, ја искористуваме рамката за преземање и повторно поврзување за пристап до КБ преку методот на традиционално преземање информации (ИР), и ги рерангираме преземените кандидати со помоќни нервни мрежи како што е предобучениот модел БЕРТ. Со оглед на фактот дека директно доделувањето на различен модел на БЕРТ за секоја подзадача може да носи забранливи трошоци, предложуваме да споделиме кодер на БЕРТ низ сите три подзадачи и да дефинираме слоеви специфични за задачите врз заедничкиот слој. Обединетиот модел потоа е обучен под рамка за учење со повеќе задачи. Експериментите покажуваат дека: (1) нашиот метод на враќање базиран на ИР е способен ефикасно да собере висококвалитетни кандидати, со што нашиот метод лесно може да се адаптира на големи КБ; (2) моделот БЕРТ ја подобрува точноста на сите три подзадачи; и (3) користејќи од мултизадачно учење, обединетиот модел добива понатамошни подобрувања со само 1/3 од оригиналните параметри. Нашиот конечен модел постигнува конкурентни резултати на сетот на податоци за едноставни прашања и супериорна изведба на сетот на податоци FreebaseQA.', 'mt': 'It-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet dwar il-bażijiet tal-għarfien (KBQA) normalment tinvolvi tliet sottokompiti, jiġifieri l-individwazzjoni tal-entità suġġetta, l-irbit tal-entità u l-individwazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet. Due to the large number of entities and relations inside knowledge bases (KB), previous work usually utilized sophisticated rules to narrow down the search space and managed only a subset of KBs in memory.  In this work, we leverage a retrieve-and-rerank framework to access KBs via traditional information retrieval (IR) method, and re-rank retrieved candidates with more powerful neural networks such as the pre-trained BERT model.  Considering the fact that directly assigning a different BERT model for each sub-task may incur prohibitive costs, we propose to share a BERT encoder across all three sub-tasks and define task-specific layers on top of the shared layer.  The unified model is then trained under a multi-task learning framework.  L-esperimenti juru li: (1) Il-metodu tagħna ta’ rkupru bbażat fuq IR huwa kapaċi jiġbor kandidati ta’ kwalità għolja b’mod effiċjenti, u b’hekk jippermetti li l-metodu tagħna jadatta faċilment għal KBs fuq skala kbira; (2) il-mudell BERT itejjeb il-preċiżjoni fit-tliet sottokompiti kollha; u (3) li jibbenefikaw minn tagħlim multikompiti, il-mudell unifikat jikseb aktar titjib b’1/3 biss tal-parametri oriġinali. Our final model achieves competitive results on the SimpleQuestions dataset and superior performance on the FreebaseQA dataset.', 'ml': 'അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്ന ചോദ്യം (കെബിക്യൂ) സാധാരണയായി മൂന്നു സബ് ജോലികളുടെ ഉത്തരം ചെയ്യുന്നു. പ്രധാനപ്പ അറിവുകളുടെ (കെബി) അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള വലിയ വസ്തുക്കളുടെയും ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെയും കാരണം മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലി സാധാരണമായി തെരയുന്ന സ്ഥലം കുറക്കുവാനും കെബി ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, പാഠമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വിട്ടെതിരിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ (IR) രീതിയിലൂടെ കെബിഎസിലേക്ക് പ്രാപ്തികമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാനുള്ള ഫ്രെയിമെയില്\u200d നാം പ എല്ലാ ഉപാധികള്\u200dക്കും നേരിട്ട് ബെര്\u200dടി മോഡല്\u200d നേരിട്ട് വ്യത്യസ്തമായി വിതരണം ചെയ്യുന്നതിന് നിഷിദ്ധമായ വിലയം ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, എല്ലാ മൂന്നു ഉപാധികള്\u200dക്ക ഒരുമിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d ഒരു പല ജോലി പഠിക്കുന്ന ഫ്രെയിമ്പില്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു: (1) നമ്മുടെ ഐആര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള വിലാസപ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥികള്\u200dക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d സാധാരണമായി സംഘടിപ്പിക്ക (2) ബെര്\u200dട്ടി മോഡല്\u200d മൂന്ന് സബ്ട് ജോലികളില്\u200d എല്ലാം ശരിയാണ് മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത്; (3) പല ജോലി പഠിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉപകാരമുണ്ട്, ഒരുമിച്ച മോഡല്\u200d മൂലം മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് ആദ്യമായ അളവുകളില്\u200d മാത നമ്മുടെ അവസാനത്തെ മോഡല്\u200d സാമില്ലാത്ത ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d മത്സരിക്കുന്ന ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നേടുന്നു. ഫ്രീബെസ്ക്യ', 'ms': 'Question answering over knowledge bases (KBQA) usually involves three sub-tasks, namely topic entity detection, entity linking and relation detection.  Kerana jumlah besar entiti dan hubungan di dalam pangkalan pengetahuan (KB), kerja terdahulu biasanya menggunakan peraturan yang canggih untuk mengurangi ruang gelintar dan mengelola hanya subset KB dalam ingatan. In this work, we leverage a retrieve-and-rerank framework to access KBs via traditional information retrieval (IR) method, and re-rank retrieved candidates with more powerful neural networks such as the pre-trained BERT model.  Mengingat fakta bahawa menukarkan model BERT yang berbeza secara langsung untuk setiap sub-tugas boleh mengakibatkan biaya yang mencegah, kami cadangkan untuk berkongsi pengekod BERT di seluruh tiga sub-tugas dan takrifkan lapisan khusus tugas di atas lapisan berkongsi. The unified model is then trained under a multi-task learning framework.  Eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa: (1) Kaedah pemulihan berasaskan IR kami mampu mengumpulkan calon kualiti tinggi secara efisien, sehingga memungkinkan kaedah kami menyesuaikan kepada KB skala besar dengan mudah; (2) the BERT model improves the accuracy across all three sub-tasks;  dan (3) mengambil keuntungan dari pembelajaran multi-tugas, model bersatu mendapat peningkatan lanjut dengan hanya 1/3 dari parameter asal. Our final model achieves competitive results on the SimpleQuestions dataset and superior performance on the FreebaseQA dataset.', 'mn': 'Мэдлэгийн суурь (KBQA) дээр хариулт өгсөн асуулт нь ихэвчлэн гурван суб-даалгавартай байдаг. Энэ нь сэдвийн суурь зүйлсийг олох, нэгж холбоотой, харилцааны нээлт. Мэдлэгийн суурь доторх бүтэц болон харилцаа олон (КБ) учраас өмнөх ажил хайлтын орон зайг багасгаж, зөвхөн КБ-ын суурь багасгаж байдаг. Энэ ажлын тулд бид уламжлалт мэдээллийн авах (IR) аргаар КБ-д хүрэх болон дахин хүчтэй мэдрэлийн сүлжээний шалгалтыг ашиглах боломжтой болгож, илүү хүчтэй мэдрэлийн сүлжээний хувьд дахин зарцуулсан захирагчийг дахин зарцуулдаг. Бүх үйл ажиллагааны төлөө өөр BERT загварыг шууд зарцуулахын тулд бид BERT кодерийг бүх 3 суб-үйл ажиллагааны төлөө хуваалцах боломжтой болно. Нэгдсэн загвар нь олон ажлын суралцах үйл ажиллагааны доор суралцагдсан. Ингээд туршилт нь: (1) Бидний ИР-д суурилсан авах арга нь өндөр чадвартай хүндрэгчдийг үр ашигтай цуглуулж чадна. Иймээс бидний арга нь том хэмжээний КБ-д амархан адаптацийг ашиглаж чадна. (2) БЕРТ загвар гурван суб-даалгаврын даалгаврын зөв байдлыг сайжруулдаг. (3) олон ажлын суралцаас ашиглах боломжтой. Нэгдсэн загвар нь зөвхөн 1/3 нь эхний параметртэй илүү сайжруулагддаг. Манай сүүлийн загвар FreebaseQA өгөгдлийн сангийн энгийн асуулт өгөгдлийн сан болон өндөр үйл ажиллагааны үр дүнг гаргадаг.', 'pl': 'Odpowiadanie na pytania za pośrednictwem baz wiedzy (KBQA) zazwyczaj obejmuje trzy podzadania, a mianowicie wykrywanie podmiotów tematycznych, łączenie podmiotów i wykrywanie relacji. Ze względu na dużą liczbę podmiotów i relacji wewnątrz baz wiedzy (KB), poprzednie prace zazwyczaj wykorzystywały zaawansowane reguły do zawężenia przestrzeni wyszukiwania i zarządzały tylko podzbiorem KBs w pamięci. W niniejszej pracy wykorzystujemy framework odzyskiwania i ponownego rankingu, aby uzyskać dostęp do KBs za pomocą tradycyjnej metody odzyskiwania informacji (IR) oraz ponownie rankingować pozyskanych kandydatów za pomocą potężniejszych sieci neuronowych, takich jak wstępnie przeszkolony model BERT. Biorąc pod uwagę fakt, że bezpośrednie przypisanie innego modelu BERT dla każdego podzadania może wiązać się z niewysokimi kosztami, proponujemy udostępnienie kodera BERT we wszystkich trzech podzadaniach i zdefiniowanie warstw specyficznych dla zadania na wierzchu wspólnej warstwy. Ujednolicony model jest następnie szkolony w ramach wielozadaniowych ram uczenia się. Eksperymenty pokazują, że: (1) Nasza metoda pozyskiwania oparta na IR jest w stanie skutecznie zbierać wysokiej jakości kandydatów, dzięki czemu nasza metoda łatwo dostosowuje się do dużych KBs; (2) model BERT poprawia dokładność we wszystkich trzech podzadaniach; i (3) korzystając z wielozadaniowego uczenia się, ujednolicony model uzyskuje dalsze ulepszenia tylko z 1/3 pierwotnych parametrów. Nasz ostateczny model osiąga konkurencyjne wyniki na zbiorze danych SimpleQuestions oraz doskonałą wydajność na zbiorze danych FreebaseQA.', 'no': 'Spørsmål som svarar over kunnskapsbaser (KBQA) inneheld vanlegvis tre underoppgåver, som er oppdaging av emnene, eininga som lenkjer og relasjonsoppdaging. På grunn av stor tal einingar og relasjonar i kunnskapsbaser (KB) brukt tidlegare arbeid sofistikerte reglar for å redusera søkjeområdet og styra berre ein subgruppe av KB i minne. I denne arbeiden leverer vi ein framlegg for henting og gjenoppretting til å tilgang KBs via tradisjonell informasjonshenting (IR) metode, og gjenoppretta kandidatane med meir kraftige nøyralnettverk som den først trengte BERT-modellen. I tillegg til at direkte tilordning av ein annan BERT-modell for kvar underoppgåve kan føre til forhindring av kostnader, foreslår vi å dele ein BERT-koder over alle tre underoppgåver og definera oppgåver-spesifikke lag øvre det delte laget. Den einaste modellen er derfor trent under eit multioppgåve læringsrammeverk. Eksperimentar viser at: (1) Vårt IR-basert tilbakekallingsmetode kan samla høg kvalitet kandidatar effektivt, slik at metoden vårt kan tilpassa til stor skala KBs enkelt. (2) BERT-modellen forbedrar nøyaktighet over alle tre underoppgåver; og (3) som brukar fleire oppgåver i læring, får det unifiserte modellen meir forbetringar med berre 1/3 av dei originale parametrane. Det siste modellen vår oppnår konkurrentiv resultat på datasettet for enkelte spørsmål og høgare utvikling på datasettet FreebaseQA.', 'sr': 'Pitanje na odgovor na baze znanja (KBQA) obično uključuje tri podzadatka, to je otkrivanje temskih subjekta, entiteta povezanja i otkrivanje odnosa. Zbog velikog broja entiteta i odnosa unutar baza znanja (KB), prethodni rad je obično korišteno sofisticirano pravilo da smanji prostor pretraživanja i upravlja samo podgrupom KB u pamćenju. U ovom poslu, uključivamo okvir prikupljanja i preokretanja za pristup KBs putem tradicionalnog metode prikupljanja informacija (IR), i ponovno postavljamo kandidate prikupljene sa moćnijim neuralnim mrežama poput predobučenog model a BERT. S obzirom na činjenicu da direktno određivanje različitih BERT model a za svaki podzadatak može imati zabranjene troškove, predlažemo da dijelimo BERT koder u svim tri podzadataka i definišemo slojeve specifične zadataka na vrhu zajedničkog sloja. Ujedinjen model je onda obučen u okviru učenja više zadataka. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je: (1) Naša metoda otkupljanja na IR-u sposobna da efikasno prikupi kvalitetne kandidate, tako omogućava našu metodu da se lako prilagodi velikoj skali KB-a; (2) model BERT poboljšava tačnost svih tri podzadataka; i (3) u koristi od učenja više zadataka, ujedinjeni model dobija daljnje poboljšanje sa samo 1/3 originalnih parametara. Naš poslednji model postiže konkurentne rezultate na setu podataka jednostavnih pitanja i nadmoćnijim izvedbama na setu podataka FreebaseQA.', 'ro': 'Răspunsul la întrebări prin baze de cunoștințe (KBQA) implică, de obicei, trei subsarcini, și anume detectarea entităților subiecte, legătura entităților și detectarea relațiilor. Datorită numărului mare de entități și relații în interiorul bazelor de cunoștințe (KB), lucrările anterioare au utilizat de obicei reguli sofisticate pentru a restrânge spațiul de căutare și au gestionat doar un subset de KB în memorie. În această lucrare, utilizăm un cadru recuperează-și-re-banking pentru a accesa KBs prin metoda tradițională de recuperare a informațiilor (IR) și re-ranking candidații recuperați cu rețele neurale mai puternice, cum ar fi modelul BERT pre-instruit. Având în vedere faptul că atribuirea directă a unui model BERT diferit pentru fiecare subactivitate poate implica costuri prohibitive, propunem partajarea unui codificator BERT în toate cele trei subactivități și definirea straturilor specifice sarcinii deasupra stratului partajat. Modelul unificat este apoi instruit în cadrul unui cadru de învățare multi-task. Experimentele arată că: (1) Metoda noastră de recuperare bazată pe IR este capabilă să colecteze eficient candidați de înaltă calitate, permițând astfel metodei noastre să se adapteze cu ușurință la KBs la scară largă; (2) modelul BERT îmbunătățește precizia tuturor celor trei subsarcini; și (3) beneficiind de învățarea multi-task, modelul unificat obține îmbunătățiri suplimentare cu doar 1/3 din parametrii inițiali. Modelul nostru final obține rezultate competitive pe setul de date SimpleQuestions și performanțe superioare pe setul de date FreebaseQA.', 'si': 'දන්නවන අධ්\u200dයතාවය (KBQA) ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම සුබ- වැඩක් තුනක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනවා, අධ්\u200dයතාවය පර @ info: whatsthis මේ වැඩේදී, අපි ප්\u200dරවේශිත තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරවේශනය (IR) විධානයෙන් KBs වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශ හැම උපක්\u200dරියාව සඳහා වෙනස් BERT මොඩල් එකක් වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් සැලසුම් කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, අපි BERT කෝඩාර් එකක් හැම උපක්\u200dරියාවක් තුනක් සම්පුර්ණයෙන එකතු මෝඩල් එක්ක ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් වෙලාවක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන්. පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට: (1) අපේ IR-ආධාරිත පරීක්ෂණ පද්ධතිය පිළිගන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂතාවක් සම්බන්ධ වෙ (2) BERT නිර්මාණය සාමාන්\u200dය වැඩ තුනක් වැඩ කරනවා; සහ (3) ගොඩක් වැඩක් වැඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, එකතු මෝඩල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය 1/3 විතරයි. අපේ අන්තිම මොඩල් එක්ක සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්න දත්ත සැට් එක්ක සහ freebaseQA දත්ත සෙට් එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙනවා.', 'so': "Jawaabta su'aalaha ku saabsan aasaasiga aqoonta (KBQA) sida caadiga ah waxaa ka mid ah saddex shaqooyin sub-shaqo, tusaale ahaan aqoonsiga mada, bogga xiriirka iyo baaritaanka xiriirka. Sababta aqoonta (KB) waxaa lagu isticmaalaa shuqullada hore oo sida caadiga ah waxaa loo isticmaalaa qaynuunno saafi ah si loo hoosaysiiyo booska raadinta iyo u maamulay koob ka mid ah KBs. Markaas waxan ku shaqeynaa, waxaynu KBs ku isticmaalnaa qaababka taariikhda ah (IR) oo lagu soo celin karo kandidada oo leh shabakado xoog badan oo neurada sida modelka hore ee BERT. Sida xaqiiqada ah in qaab toos u dhigista model BERT oo u gaaraya sub-shaqo kasta waxaa laga yaabaa inuu sameeyo kharash kharash diidmo ah, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in kooban BERT ku qeybinno saddexda shaqooyin oo dhan, waxaana ku qornaa qayb-gaar ah oo shaqada ku qoran. Tusaale wadajir ah waxaa lagu tababariyaa hoos loo baro waxbarasho shaqo badan. Imtixaanka waxaa tusi kara: (1) qaababka dib u soo celinta ee IR-ku saleysan waa awoodi karaa in ay si fiican u soo ururiyaan kandidayada qiimaha sare, sidaa darteed qaababkayaga ayaa si fudud ugu habboon karta KBs-ka badan; (2) Tusaalada BERT wuxuu kordhiyaa saxda ku saabsan saddexda shaqo hoose oo dhan; (3) Kaalmeynta waxbarashada shaqo badan, qaababka isku qabsadayna wuxuu heli karaa hagaajin dheeraad ah oo kaliya 1/3 parameters asalka ah. Tusaale ahaan ugu danbeeya wuxuu sameyn karaa arimaha iskaashatada ee ku saabsan macluumaadka Iswidishka iyo tababarka ka sareeya ee macluumaadka FreebaseQA.", 'ta': 'அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படைகளின் மேல் கேள்வி பதில் (KBQA) வழக்கமாக மூன்று துணை பணிகளை சேர்க்கிறது, அதாவது தலைப்பு பொருள் கண்டுபிடிப்பது, பொ @ info இந்த வேலையில், நாம் கேபிகளை அணுகுவதற்கான மீண்டும் மற்றும் மீண்டும் சட்டத்தை வழங்குகிறோம் மரபார்ந்த தகவல் மீட்டும் (IR) முறைமையில், மற்றும் மீண்டும் நிறுவ ஒவ்வொரு துணை பணிக்கும் நேரடியாக ஒரு BERT மாதிரி பங்கீடு செய்வதால் தடுப்பு செலவு செய்யலாம், நாம் பிரெட் குறியீட்டை எல்லா மூன்று துணை பணிகளுக்கும் மேல் பி The unified model is then trained under a multi-task learning framework.  முயற்சிகள் காட்டுகிறது: (1) நம் IR-அடிப்படையிலான மீட்டெடுப்பு முறைமையை உயர்தரமான தேர்வாளர்களை சேகரிக்க முடியும், அதனால் எங்கள் முறைமையை ப (2) BERT மாதிரி எல்லா மூன்று துணை பணிகளுக்கும் சரியை மேம்படுத்துகிறது; and (3) benefiting from multi-task learning, the unified model obtains further improvements with only 1/3 of the original parameters.  எளிய கேள்விகள் தரவுத்தளம் மற்றும் மேலான செயல்பாட்டின் முடிவு முடிவுகள் பெறுகிறது.', 'sv': 'Frﾃ･gesvar ﾃｶver kunskapsbaser (KBQA) omfattar vanligtvis tre underuppgifter, nﾃ､mligen ﾃ､mnesentitetsdetektering, entitetslﾃ､nkning och relationsdetektering. Pﾃ･ grund av det stora antalet entiteter och relationer inuti kunskapsbaser (KB), tidigare arbete anvﾃ､nde vanligtvis sofistikerade regler fﾃｶr att begrﾃ､nsa sﾃｶkutrymmet och hanterade endast en delmﾃ､ngd KBs i minnet. I detta arbete utnyttjar vi ett ramverk fﾃｶr att komma ﾃ･t KBs via traditionell informationsﾃ･tervinningsmetod (IR) och omrﾃ､knar hﾃ､mtade kandidater med kraftfullare neurala nﾃ､tverk sﾃ･som den fﾃｶrutbildade BERT-modellen. Med tanke pﾃ･ att direkt tilldelning av en annan BERT-modell fﾃｶr varje underuppgift kan medfﾃｶra orimliga kostnader fﾃｶreslﾃ･r vi att en BERT-kodare delas ﾃｶver alla tre underuppgifterna och definierar uppgiftsspecifika lager ovanpﾃ･ det delade lagret. Den enhetliga modellen utbildas sedan under en multi-task learning ramverk. Experiment visar att: (1) Vﾃ･r IR-baserade hﾃ､mtningsmetod kan samla in hﾃｶgkvalitativa kandidater effektivt, vilket gﾃｶr det mﾃｶjligt fﾃｶr vﾃ･r metod att enkelt anpassa sig till storskaliga KBs; (2) BERT-modellen fﾃｶrbﾃ､ttrar noggrannheten fﾃｶr alla tre deluppgifterna. och (3) genom att dra nytta av multi-task learning, uppnﾃ･r den enhetliga modellen ytterligare fﾃｶrbﾃ､ttringar med endast 1/3 av de ursprungliga parametrarna. Vﾃ･r slutliga modell uppnﾃ･r konkurrenskraftiga resultat pﾃ･ SimpleQuestions dataset och ﾃｶverlﾃ､gsen prestanda pﾃ･ FreebaseQA dataset.', 'ur': 'علم بنسس (KBQA) پر جواب دینے والی سوال معمولاً تین سوب-ٹاکس کے ساتھ شامل ہوتی ہے، یعنی موضوع اتنی شناسایی، اتنی اتصال اور ارتباط شناسایی. علم bases (KB) کے اندر بہت سی تعداد کے باعث پہلے کام آسانی قوانین کو کم کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا گیا ہے اور صرف ایک KB کے سسپسٹ کو ذکر کے ذریعہ تنگ کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا گیا ہے. اس کام میں ہم نے کب کی دسترسی کے ذریعہ (IR) رسمی معلومات حاصل کرنے کے لئے ایک پھیر-پھیر-پھیر-پھیر-پھیر-پھیر-پھیر-پھیر-پھیر-پھیر لیا ہے اور اس سے زیادہ طاقتور نیورل نیورل نیٹورک کے ساتھ دوبارہ حا اس حقیقت کو دیکھتے ہیں کہ ہر sub-task کے لئے ایک مختلف BERT موڈل مقرر کرنا ممکن ہے، ہم ایک BERT کوڈر کو تمام تین sub-task وں میں شریک کرنا چاہتے ہیں اور مشترک لائر کے اوپر task-specific layers مقرر کرنا چاہتے ہیں. اس کے بعد متحدہ موڈل ایک متعدد دنیا کی تعلیم کے اندر تعلیم کی جاتی ہے. آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ: (1) ہماری IR بنیاد آئی پھیرنے کا طریقہ بہت سی کیلوٹی کاندینٹ کو آسان طور پر جمع کرنے کے لئے قادر ہے، اس طرح ہماری طریقہ بڑی اسکیل کیب کے لئے آسان طور پر اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ (2) BERT موڈل تین سابٹ کاروں میں دقیقیت کو بہتر کر دیتا ہے۔ اور (3) بہت سے کاموں کی تعلیم سے فائدہ پہنچاتے ہیں، متحدہ موڈل صرف 1/3 اصلی پارامتروں کے ساتھ اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ ہماری آخری مدل فریbaseQA ڈیٹ سٹ پر سادھے سوال ڈیٹ سٹ اور اوپر فعالیت پر مساوی نتیجے پہنچ جاتے ہیں.', 'vi': 'Câu hỏi trả lời về các căn cứ kiến thức (KBQA) thường gồm ba nhiệm vụ phụ, ví dụ như việc phát hiện thực thể, liên kết và tìm ra liên hệ. Do số lượng lớn các thực thể và quan hệ bên trong các căn cứ kiến thức (KB), công việc trước thường sử dụng các quy tắc phức tạp để thu hẹp các khoảng trống tìm kiếm và chỉ quản lý một nhóm của KBs trong bộ nhớ. Trong công việc này, chúng ta dùng hệ thống lấy lại để truy cập KB thông qua phương pháp truy cập thông tin truyền thống (IR) và phục hồi lại những ứng viên có những mạng thần kinh mạnh hơn như mô hình BERT được huấn luyện trước. Dựa vào việc phân phối trực tiếp một mô hình BERT khác nhau cho mỗi nhiệm vụ phụ có thể gây tổn hại cho các chi phí bị hạn chế. Chúng tôi đề nghị chia sẻ bộ mã hóa BERT cho cả ba nhiệm vụ phụ, và xác định các lớp đặc nhiệm nằm trên lớp chia sẻ. Kiểu thống nhất sẽ được đào tạo trong một bộ chế tập thể nhiều nhiệm vụ. Các thí nghiệm cho thấy: 1) phương pháp thu hồi IR của chúng ta có thể thu thập các ứng viên chất lượng cao hiệu quả, nhờ đó mà phương pháp có thể thích nghi với KBs trên diện rộng, (2) mô hình BERT cải thiện độ chính xác trong cả ba nhiệm vụ phụ; và(3) được hưởng lợi từ việc học tập đa nhiệm vụ, mô hình thống nhất đạt được những cải tiến thêm chỉ với 1/3 của các tham số gốc. Mẫu cuối cùng của chúng tôi đạt được kết quả cạnh tranh trên bộ dữ liệu Đơn giản Câu hỏi và khả năng cao trên bộ dữ liệu FreeBaseQA.', 'uz': "Ogohlantirish asosida javob berish (KBQA) oddiy uchta sub- vazifalar, bu mavzu obʼektlarni aniqlash, bogʻlash va bogʻliq aniqlash. @ info: whatsthis Bu ishda, biz KBs' ga qayta yuklash va qayta tarkibini ishlab chiqarishimiz, traditional maʼlumot retrieval usuli (IR) usuli orqali, va qayta darajaga qayta tahlil qilish kandidalarni, bir marta o'rganilgan BERT modeli kabi ko'proq neyural tarmoqlari bilan ishlab chiqaramiz. Har bir sub-vazifa uchun boshqa BERT modelini aniqlash mumkin, biz uchta vazifalarning hamma tub vazifalarda BERT kodlash usulini ajratish va qaytarilgan qatlamning yuqoridagi vazifa xossalarini aniqlashni istaysiz. Birlashtirilgan model bir necha vazifa o'rganish frameidagi o'rnatiladi. Tajribalar shunday ko'rsatadi: (1) Bizning IR asosida retrieval usuli yuqori balandlik kandidalarni ajratish mumkin, shunday qilib bizning metodimizni katta KBs'ga oshirish oddiy qiladi; (2) BERT modeli hamma uchta sub-vazifalarning tashkilotlari haqida aniqligini oshirish mumkin; (3) bir necha vazifa o'rganishdan foydalanish mumkin, bir birinchi model faqat asl parametrlarining 1/3 parametrlari bilan yaxshi o'zgarishga ega bo'ladi. Bizning oxirgi modelimiz oddiy savollar maʼlumotlari soni va FreebaseQA maʼlumotlar sahifasida yuqori natijalarini bajaradi.", 'bg': 'Отговарянето на въпроси по бази от знания обикновено включва три подзадачи, а именно откриване на тематични обекти, свързване на обекти и откриване на релации. Поради големия брой обекти и връзки в базите от знания (КБ), предишните работи обикновено използват сложни правила за стесняване на пространството за търсене и управляват само част от КБ в паметта. В тази работа ние използваме рамка за извличане и повторно банкиране за достъп до КБ чрез традиционния метод за извличане на информация (ИР) и пренареждаме получените кандидати с по-мощни невронни мрежи като предварително обучения модел. Като се има предвид факта, че прякото задаване на различен модел за всяка подзадача може да доведе до прекомерни разходи, предлагаме да споделим кодер за всички три подзадачи и да определим специфични за задачата слоеве върху споделения слой. След това унифицираният модел се обучава в рамка за обучение с множество задачи. Експериментите показват, че: (1) Нашият метод за извличане, базиран на инфрачервени технологии, е в състояние да събира висококачествени кандидати ефективно, като по този начин позволява на нашия метод лесно да се адаптира към широкомащабните КБ; (2) моделът BERT подобрява точността на трите подзадачи; и (3) възползвайки се от многофункционалното обучение, единният модел получава допълнителни подобрения само с 1/3 от първоначалните параметри. Крайният ни модел постига конкурентни резултати на набора от данни и превъзходна производителност на набора от данни.', 'nl': 'Vragen beantwoorden via kennisbanken (KBQA) omvat meestal drie deeltaken, namelijk topic entity detection, entity linking en relatiedetectie. Vanwege het grote aantal entiteiten en relaties binnen kennisbanken (KB) werd in eerdere werkzaamheden meestal gebruik gemaakt van geavanceerde regels om de zoekruimte te beperken en werd slechts een subset van KBs in het geheugen beheerd. In dit werk maken we gebruik van een retrieve-and-rerank framework om toegang te krijgen tot KBs via traditionele informatie retrieval (IR) methode, en rangschikken we opgehaalde kandidaten met krachtigere neurale netwerken zoals het vooraf getrainde BERT model. Gezien het feit dat het direct toewijzen van een ander BERT-model voor elke subtaak enorme kosten met zich mee kan brengen, stellen we voor om een BERT-encoder over alle drie de subtaken te delen en taakspecifieke lagen bovenop de gedeelde laag te definiëren. Het uniforme model wordt vervolgens getraind onder een multi-task leerkader. Experimenten tonen aan dat: (1) Onze IR-gebaseerde retrievalmethode in staat is om hoogwaardige kandidaten efficiënt te verzamelen, waardoor onze methode zich gemakkelijk aanpast aan grootschalige KBs; (2) het BERT-model verbetert de nauwkeurigheid van alle drie de deeltaken; en (3) profiteren van multitasking learning, het uniforme model verkrijgt verdere verbeteringen met slechts 1/3 van de oorspronkelijke parameters. Ons uiteindelijke model bereikt concurrerende resultaten op de SimpleQuestions dataset en superieure prestaties op de FreebaseQA dataset.', 'da': 'Spørgsmål besvarelse over vidensbaser (KBQA) omfatter normalt tre underopgaver, nemlig emneområdedetektering, entitetslinking og relationsregistrering. På grund af det store antal enheder og relationer inden for vidensbaser (KB), tidligere arbejde brugte normalt sofistikerede regler til at indsnævre søgeområdet og administrerede kun en delmængde KBer i hukommelsen. I dette arbejde udnytter vi en hente-og-re-ank framework til at få adgang til KBs via traditionel informationshentning (IR) metode, og genrangerer hentede kandidater med mere kraftfulde neurale netværk såsom den forudtrænede BERT model. I betragtning af, at direkte tildeling af en anden BERT-model for hver underopgave kan medføre store omkostninger, foreslår vi at dele en BERT-koder på tværs af alle tre underopgaver og definere opgavespecifikke lag oven på det fælles lag. Den samlede model trænes derefter under en multi-task læringsramme. Eksperimenter viser, at: (1) Vores IR-baserede hentningsmetode er i stand til at indsamle kandidater af høj kvalitet effektivt, hvilket gør det muligt for vores metode nemt at tilpasse sig store KBs; (2) BERT-modellen forbedrer nøjagtigheden på tværs af alle tre underopgaver og (3) den samlede model opnår yderligere forbedringer med kun 1/3 af de oprindelige parametre, fordi den nyder godt af multi-task-læring. Vores endelige model opnår konkurrencedygtige resultater på SimpleQuestions datasættet og overlegen ydeevne på FreebaseQA datasættet.', 'hr': 'Pitanje na odgovor na baze znanja (KBQA) obično uključuje tri podzadatka, a to je otkrivanje temskih subjekta, objekta povezanja i otkrivanje odnosa. Zbog velikog broja entitata i odnosa unutar baza znanja (KB), prethodni rad obično koristi sofisticirane pravila za smanjenje prostora pretraživanja i upravljanje samo podgrupom KB u pamćenju. U ovom poslu, uključujemo okvir prikupljanja i preokretanja za pristup KBs putem tradicionalnog metoda prikupljanja informacija (IR), i ponovno uključujemo kandidate s moćnijim nervnim mrežama poput predobučenog model a BERT-a. S obzirom na činjenicu da izravno određivanje različitih BERT model a za svaki podzadatak može imati zabranjene troškove, predlažemo podijeliti BERT koder u svim tri podzadataka i definirati slojeve specifične zadataka na vrhu zajedničkog sloja. Ujedinjen model je onda obučen pod višezadatačnim okvirom učenja. Eksperimenti pokazuju da: (1) Naša metoda prikupljanja na IR-u može učinkovito prikupiti kvalitetne kandidate, tako omogućava da se naš metod lako prilagodi velikoj skali KB-a; (2) model BERT poboljšava preciznost u svim tri podzadatka; i (3) u koristi od učenja višezadataka, ujedinjeni model dobija daljnje poboljšanje s samo 1/3 originalnih parametara. Naš konačni model postigne konkurentne rezultate na setu podataka jednostavnih pitanja i nadmoćnijim učinkovima na setu podataka FreebaseQA.', 'de': 'Die Beantwortung von Fragen über Wissensbasen (KBQA) umfasst in der Regel drei Teilaufgaben, nämlich Themenentitätserkennung, Entitätsverknüpfung und Beziehungserkennung. Aufgrund der großen Anzahl von Entitäten und Beziehungen innerhalb von Wissensbasen (KB) wurden in früheren Arbeiten meist ausgefeilte Regeln verwendet, um den Suchraum einzugrenzen und nur eine Teilmenge von KBs im Speicher verwaltet. In dieser Arbeit nutzen wir ein Retrieve-and-Rerank-Framework, um mittels traditioneller IR-Methode auf KBs zuzugreifen und abgerufene Kandidaten mit leistungsfähigeren neuronalen Netzwerken wie dem vortrainierten BERT-Modell neu zu rangieren. In Anbetracht der Tatsache, dass die direkte Zuweisung eines anderen BERT-Modells für jede Teilaufgabe unerschwingliche Kosten verursachen kann, schlagen wir vor, einen BERT-Encoder für alle drei Teilaufgaben zu verwenden und aufgabenspezifische Ebenen über der geteilten Ebene zu definieren. Das einheitliche Modell wird dann unter einem Multi-Task Learning Framework trainiert. Experimente zeigen, dass: (1) Unsere IR-basierte Retrieval-Methode in der Lage ist, qualitativ hochwertige Kandidaten effizient zu sammeln, so dass unsere Methode leicht an große KBs angepasst werden kann; (2) das BERT-Modell verbessert die Genauigkeit aller drei Teilaufgaben; und (3) profitiert das vereinheitlichte Modell von Multi-Task-Learning und erhält weitere Verbesserungen mit nur 1/3 der ursprünglichen Parameter. Unser endgültiges Modell erzielt wettbewerbsfähige Ergebnisse auf dem SimpleQuestions-Datensatz und überlegene Leistung auf dem FreebaseQA-Datensatz.', 'id': 'Jawaban pertanyaan di atas dasar pengetahuan (KBQA) biasanya melibatkan tiga sub-tugas, yaitu deteksi entitas topik, menghubungkan entitas dan deteksi hubungan. Karena jumlah besar entitas dan hubungan di dalam dasar pengetahuan (KB), pekerjaan sebelumnya biasanya menggunakan aturan yang canggih untuk mempersempit ruang pencarian dan mengelola hanya subset KB dalam ingatan. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami menggunakan rangkaian retrieve-and-re rank untuk mengakses KB melalui metode retrieval informasi tradisional (IR), dan mengubah rangkaian kandidat retrieved dengan jaringan saraf yang lebih kuat seperti model BERT yang terlatih sebelumnya. Mengingat fakta bahwa secara langsung menyerahkan model BERT yang berbeda untuk setiap sub-tugas dapat mengakibatkan biaya proyektif, kami menyarankan untuk berbagi pengekode BERT di seluruh tiga sub-tugas dan mendefinisikan lapisan-spesifik tugas di atas lapisan berbagi. Model bersatu kemudian dilatih di bawah rangka belajar multi-tugas. Experiments show that: (1) Our IR-based retrieval method is able to collect high-quality candidates efficiently, thus enables our method adapt to large-scale KBs easily;  (2) the BERT model improves the accuracy across all three sub-tasks;  dan (3) berguna dari belajar multi-tugas, model bersatu mendapatkan peningkatan lanjut dengan hanya 1/3 dari parameter asli. Model akhir kita mencapai hasil kompetitif pada set data SimpleQuestions dan prestasi yang lebih baik pada set data FreebaseQA.', 'fa': 'سؤال پاسخ بر پایگاه دانش (KBQA) معمولاً سه کار زیر، یعنی شناسایی عنوان موضوع، متصل و شناسایی ارتباط است. به دلیل تعداد زیادی از عناصر و رابطه\u200cهای درون پایگاه\u200cهای علم (KB) کار قبلی معمولاً قانون\u200cهای متفاوتی را استفاده می\u200cکند تا فضای جستجو را کاهش کند و فقط یک زیر زیر کیب در حافظه مدیریت می\u200cکند. در این کار، ما یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها با توجه به این حقیقت که مستقیماً یک مدل BERT متفاوتی برای هر زیر کار ممکن است هزینه\u200cهای حرام را در اختیار داشته باشد، پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که یک رمز BERT را در تمام سه زیر کار تقسیم کنیم و طبقه\u200cهای خاص کار را بر بالای طبقه مشترک تعریف کنیم. مدل متحد بعدش تحت یک چهارچوب یادگیری چند کار آموزش می\u200cشود. تجربه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند: (۱) روش بازیابی بر پایه IR ما قادر است که کاندیدای کاندیدای بالا را به طور موثر جمع کند، بنابراین روش ما را به طور آسانی به مقیاس بزرگ KB adapt می\u200cکند. (۲) مدل BERT دقیق را در تمام سه کار زیر بهتر می\u200cکند; و (۳) از یادگیری بسیاری از کار، مدل متحد بیشتری با فقط ۱/۳ از پارامتر اصلی می\u200cگیرد. مدل نهایی ما نتایج رقابتی در مجموعه داده\u200cهای ساده سوال و عملکرد بالاترین روی مجموعه داده\u200cهای FreebaseQA را می\u200cرساند.', 'ko': '지식 라이브러리 문답은 일반적으로 세 가지 하위 임무, 즉 주제 실체 검측, 실체 링크와 관계 검측과 관련된다.지식 라이브러리에 대량의 실체와 관계가 있기 때문에 이전의 작업은 복잡한 규칙을 사용하여 검색 공간을 축소하고 메모리에 있는 지식 라이브러리의 하위 집합만 관리했다.이 작업에서 우리는 검색과 라이브러리 프레임워크를 이용하여 전통적인 정보 검색(IR) 방법으로 KBS에 접근하고 더욱 강력한 신경 네트워크(예를 들어 미리 훈련된 BERT 모델)를 사용하여 검색된 후보 대상을 다시 정렬한다.각 하위 임무에 서로 다른 BERT 모델을 직접 분배하는 것은 높은 비용을 초래할 수 있음을 감안하여 우리는 모든 세 개의 하위 임무에서 BERT 인코더를 공유하고 공유 층의 맨 위에 임무에 특정한 층을 정의하는 것을 권장합니다.그리고 다중 임무 학습 틀에서 통일 모델을 훈련한다.실험에 의하면 (1) 적외선 검색 방법을 바탕으로 고품질의 후보어를 효과적으로 수집하여 우리의 방법이 대규모 지식 라이브러리에 쉽게 적응할 수 있도록 한다.(2) 버트 모형은 모든 세 개의 하위 임무의 정확성을 향상시켰다.(3) 다중 임무 학습 덕분에 통일 모델은 원시 파라미터의 1/3만 있으면 더욱 개선되었다.우리의 최종 모델은SimpleQuestions 데이터 집합에서 경쟁력 있는 결과를 얻었고FreebaseQA 데이터 집합에서 우수한 성능을 얻었다.', 'sw': 'Swali la kujibu juu ya misingi ya maarifa (KBQA) mara nyingi huhusisha kazi tatu za vigogo, yaani kutambua mada, taasisi inayounganisha na kutambua mahusiano. Kutokana na idadi kubwa ya vitu na mahusiano ndani ya msingi wa maarifa (KB), kazi iliyopita mara nyingi zilitumika sheria za kisasa ili kupunguza nafasi ya kutafuta na kusimamia vigogo tu vya KBs huko kumbukumbu. Katika kazi hii, tunatumia mfumo wa upya na upya wa upya wa KBs kupitia njia ya upatikanaji wa taarifa za kitamaduni (IR), na kuwapa wagombea tena vyeo vikubwa zaidi na mitandao ya neura kama vile modeli ya BERT iliyoendeshwa kabla. Considering the fact that directly assigning a different BERT model for each sub-task may incur prohibitive costs, we propose to share a BERT encoder across all three sub-tasks and define task-specific layers on top of the shared layer.  Mfano wa muungano unafundishwa chini ya mfumo wa kujifunza kazi nyingi. Majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa: (1) njia yetu ya kupeleka kwa kutumia IR inaweza kukusanya wagombea wa kiwango kikubwa kwa ufanisi, kwa hiyo inawezesha njia zetu kubadili KBs kwa urahisi; (2) Mradi wa BERT unaboresha uhakika katika kazi tatu za subira; na kusaidia kutokana na kujifunza kwa kazi nyingi, muundo wa pamoja unapata maboresho zaidi kwa kipimo cha awali 1/3 tu. Mfano wetu wa mwisho unafanikiwa matokeo ya ushindani kuhusu seti ya maswali rahisi na utendaji bora zaidi kwenye seti ya data za FreebaseQA.', 'tr': 'Bilim baselerinde soraglar (KBQA) üç sub-zady ýazmakda, meýdança hedefleri tanyşdyrma, hedef baglaşdyrma we baglaýyşy tanyşdyrma mümkin edýär. Bilim baselerinde birnäçe faýllar we ilişkiler üçin (KB), öňki işiň adatça sofistikli kurallaryny azaltmak üçin ullanýar we diňe bir kB faýllaryň ýerini ýetleşdirdi. Bu işde, KBs\'e adaty informasiýa almak (IR) yöntemi bilen ýene-tertiblemek we ýene-tertiblemek üçin bir çerçevemi çykarýarys we bellenenleri güçlü näral şebekeleri bilen ýene-tertiblemek üçin çykarýarys. Her alt-zadyň beýleki BERT nusgasyna düzenlemek üçin gadyry maslahat bolmagy ahmal bolmagy ahmal, biz BERT ködlemeni üç alt-zadyň üstünde paylaşmaga we gören-häsiýetli katlary paylaşmaga teklip edýäris. Birleşik nusga soňra birnäçe zady öwrenmek üçin bilinmediler. Denminatlar şonuň ýagdaýyny görkezýär: (1) IR-esasynda gatnaş yöntemimiz ýokary kaliwatli kandidýalary oňat bilen ýygnap biler, şonuň üçin biziň täzimimizi uly ölçekleýän KBlere aňsatlyk bilen üýtgetmegi mümkin edýär; (2) BERT nusgasy üç sub-zadyň arasynda dogrylygyny geliştirir; (3) köp-täblik öwrenmesinden faydalanýar, birleşen nusga diňe özel parameterleriň 1/3 bilen täze gelişmeleri gazanýar. Biziň iň soňky nusgymyz FreebaseQA datasetinde "Simple Questions veri seti" we üst eserleşmelerinde ýaryşykly netijeleri başarýar.', 'sq': 'Përgjigja e pyetjeve mbi bazat e njohurive (KBQA) zakonisht përfshin tre nëndetyra, veçanërisht zbulimin e njësisë tematike, lidhjen e njësisë dhe zbulimin e marrëdhënieve. Për shkak të numrit të madh të njësive dhe marrëdhënieve brenda bazave të njohurive (KB), puna e mëparshme zakonisht përdori rregulla të sofistikuara për të ngushtuar hapësirën e kërkimit dhe menaxhuar vetëm një nëngrup KB në kujtim. Në këtë punë, ne nxjerrim një kuadër tërheqjeje-dhe-ringjallje për të hyrë në KB nëpërmjet metodës tradicionale të marrjes së informacionit (IR) dhe rindërtojmë kandidatët e marrë me rrjete më të fuqishme nervore të tilla si modeli i paratrajnuar BERT. Duke konsideruar faktin se caktimi drejtpërdrejt i një modeli të ndryshëm BERT për çdo nëndetyrë mund të sjellë kosto ndaluese, ne propozojmë të ndajmë një kodues BERT në të tre nëndetyrat dhe të përcaktojmë nivele specifike për detyrat mbi nivelin e ndarë. Modeli i unifikuar është trajnuar në kuadrin e mësimit me shumë detyra. Eksperimentet tregojnë se: (1) Metoda jonë e marrjes bazuar në IR është në gjendje të mbledhë kandidatët e cilësisë së lartë në mënyrë të efektshme, kështu që mundëson metodën tonë të përshtatet lehtë me KB në shkallë të madhe; (2) modeli BERT përmirëson saktësinë në të tre nëndetyrat; and (3) benefiting from multi-task learning, the unified model obtains further improvements with only 1/3 of the original parameters.  Modeli ynë përfundimtar arrin rezultate konkurruese në grupin e të dhënave për Pyetje të thjeshta dhe performancë më të lartë në grupin e të dhënave FreebaseQA.', 'am': 'የዕውቀት መቀመጫዎች ላይ ጥያቄ (KBQA) የሚመልስ ጥያቄ በጊዜው ሦስት ደብዳቤ ስራዎችን ያሳያል፣ የጉዳዩ አካባቢ ግንኙነት እና ግንኙነት አግኝቷል፡፡ ወደ እውቀት መቀመጫዎች ውስጥ ያሉት አካባቢዎች እና ግንኙነት በኩል፣ የቀድሞው ስራ በተለየ የፊፊስቲካ ሥርዓቶችን ለመጠቀም እና የKBs ቅድሚያ ማሳሰቢያ ብቻ ለመጠበቅ ይጠቅማል፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ KBs በተለወጠው መረጃ ማግኘት (IR) method ለማግኘት እናስቀድዳለን፡፡ በሦስት ደብዳቤዎች ሁሉ ላይ የBERT ዓይነት አካባቢ እና በተካፈለ ደረጃዎች ላይ የተለየ አድራሻ ምርጫዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በኋላም የተጠቃሚ ሞዴል በብዙ ስራ ትምህርት ፍሬም ነው፡፡ ፈተናዎች እንዲህ ያሳየቃሉ:(1) የIR-based ማስታወቂያው ማድረግ ማድረግ ከፍተኛ የጥሩ ምናዳዮችን እንዲሰበስብ ይችላል፣ ስለዚህ መንገዳችንን በትልቅ KBs እንዲያቃጥል ይችላል፤ (2) BERT ሞዴል በሦስቱ ደብዳቤዎች ሁሉ እርግጠቱን ያሳድጋል፤ (3) በብዛት ስራ ትምህርት የሚጠቅመው፣ የተጠቃሚ ሞዴል በመጀመሪያው parameters በ1/3 ብቻ የሚሻለውን አግኝቷል፡፡ የፍጻሜው ሞዴሌያችን በነፃነት የQA ዳታ ማዕከላዊ ጥያቄ እና የበለጠ ጥያቄ ውጤቶችን አግኝቷል፡፡', 'hy': 'Հարցերի պատասխանը գիտելիքի հիմքերի (ԿԲՔԱ) մասին սովորաբար ներառում է երեք ենթախնդիրներ, հատկապես թեմային էության հայտնաբերումը, էության կապերը և հարաբերությունների հայտնաբերումը: Քանի որ գիտելիքի հիմքերի մեջ բազմաթիվ միավորներ և հարաբերություններ կան, նախորդ աշխատանքը սովորաբար օգտագործում է բարդ կանոններ որոնման տարածքի սահմանափակելու համար և ղեկավարում է հիշողության մեջ ընդամենը մի քանի ԿԲ-ներ: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք օգտագործում ենք վերադարձ և վերադարձ կառուցվածք, որպեսզի հասնենք ԿԲ-ներին ավանդական տեղեկատվության վերադարձման (ԻՌ) մեթոդի միջոցով, և վերադասավորում ենք վերադարձված թեկնածուներին ավելի հզոր նեյրոնային ցանցերով, ինչպիսիք են Եթե հաշվի առնենք այն փաստը, որ յուրաքանչյուր ենթախնդրի համար անմիջապես մեկ այլ BERT մոդել տրամադրելը կարող է արգելափակցնող արժեքներ առաջացնել, մենք առաջարկում ենք կիսել BERT կոդերը բոլոր երեք ենթախնդիրների ընթացքում և որոշել խնդիրների հատուկ շերտե Հետո միավորված մոդելը կրթություն է ստանում բազմախնդիրների ուսումնասիրության շրջանակում: Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ: (1) Մեր IT-ով հիմնված վերադարձման մեթոդը կարողանում է արդյունավետ հավաքել բարձր որակի թեկնածուներ, այսպես հնարավորություն է տալիս մեր մեթոդը հարմարվել մեծ քանակությամբ ԿԲ-ներին: (2) BER-ի մոդելը բարելավում է ճշգրտությունը բոլոր երեք ենթախնդիրների ընթացքում: և (3) օգտագործելով բազմախնդիրների ուսումնասիրությունը, միավորված մոդելը շարունակում է զարգացնել միայն մեկ երրորդ սկզբնական պարամետերով: Մեր վերջնական մոդելը ստանում է մրցակցության արդյունքներ պարզ հարցերի տվյալների համակարգում և ավելի լավ արդյունքներ ազատ հիմքի QA տվյալների համակարգում:', 'af': "Vraog antwoord oor kennis bases (KQA) is gewoonlik drie sub- opdragte, naamlik onderwerp entiteit opskrif, entiteit verkoppeling en verwanting opskrif. Dus die groot aantal entiteite en relasies binne kennis bases (Kb), die vorige werk gewoonlik gebruik word sofistikeerde reëls om die soektog spasie te verdruk en slegs 'n subdele Kb in geheue te bestuur. In hierdie werk het ons 'n herhaal-en-herank raamwerk gebruik om toegang te kry in Kbs deur tradisionele inligting ontvang (IR) metode, en herrang afgeneem kandidate met meer kragtige neuralnetwerke soos die voorafgevore BERT model. Aangaande die feit dat direk 'n ander BERT model toewys vir elke subtaak kan prohibitiewe koste inkom, ons voorstel om 'n BERT enkoder te deel oor alle drie subtaak en definieer taak-spesifieke lagte bo van die gedeelde laag. Die eenvoudige model is dan onder 'n multi-taak leer raamwerk opgelei. Eksperimente vertoon dat: (1) Ons IR-gebaseerde herhaal metode is in staat om hoë-kwaliteit kandidate effektief te samel, sodat ons metode maklik aan groot-skaal Kb aanpasmaak; en (2) die BERT-model verbeter die presisie oor alle drie sub-opdragte; en (3) wat van multi-taak-leer gebruik word, verdere verbeteringe verkry die eenstelde model met slegs 1/3 van die oorspronklike parameters. Ons eindelike model bereik mededingsresultate op die Eenvoudige Vrag datastel en superior effektuur op die FreebaseQA datastel.", 'bn': 'জ্ঞানের বেসের (কেবিকিউএ) প্রশ্নের উত্তর সাধারণত ত তিনটি সাব-কাজের মধ্যে রয়েছে, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে বিষয়বস্তু সনাক্ত, বস্তুর লিঙ্ক এবং  জ্ঞানের বেসের (কেবি) ভেতরের অন্তর্ভুক্ত বস্তুর সংখ্যা এবং সম্পর্কের কারণে পূর্ববর্তী কাজ সাধারণত অনুসন্ধানের স্থান কমিয়ে দেওয়ার জন্য সাধারণ এই কাজে আমরা ঐতিহ্যবাহী তথ্য পুনরুদ্ধার (আইআর) পদ্ধতির মাধ্যমে কে- বিবিসে প্রবেশের একটি ফ্রেম পুনরুদ্ধার করি এবং পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত বিআরটি মডেলের মতো শক্তিশালী নিউরেল ন এই বাস্তবতা বিবেরেটের জন্য সরাসরি ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন মডেল দিয়ে প্রত্যেক সাব-কাজের জন্য নিষিদ্ধ খরচের জন্য বিবেরেটের কোডার শেয়ার করার প্রস্তাব করেছি এব এই একত্রিত মডেল অনেক কাজের শিক্ষা ফ্রেমের অধীনে প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়। পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে: (১) আমাদের আইআর-ভিত্তিক পুনরুদ্ধার পদ্ধতি কার্যকর করে উচ্চ মানের প্রার্থীদের সংগ্রহ করতে পারে, তাই আমাদের পদ্ধতি বিশাল ক (2) বেরেট মডেল সকল তিনটি সাব-কাজের মধ্যে সঠিকভাবে উন্নত করে; আর (৩) মাল্টিক কাজ শিক্ষা থেকে সুবিধা প্রদান করে, একত্রিত মডেল মূল প্যারামিটারের মাত্র ১/৩ মাত্র উন্নতি পায়। আমাদের চূড়ান্ত মডেল সাধারণ প্রশ্নের ডাটাসেট এবং ফ্রিবেসিকিয়া ডাটাসেটের উপর প্রতিযোগিতার ফলাফল অর্জন করে।', 'bs': 'Pitanje na odgovor na baze znanja (KBQA) obično uključuje tri podzadatka, a to je otkrivanje temskih subjekta, objekta povezanja i otkrivanje odnosa. Zbog velikog broja entitata i odnosa unutar baza znanja (KB), prethodni rad obično je koristio sofisticirane pravila da smanji prostor pretraživanja i upravlja samo podgrupom KB u pamćenju. U ovom poslu, uključujemo okvir za preuzimanje i preokretanje za pristup KBs putem tradicionalnog metode prikupljanja informacija (IR), i ponovno uključujemo kandidate sa moćnijim nervnim mrežama poput predobučenog model a BERT-a. S obzirom na činjenicu da direktno određivanje različitih BERT model a za svaki podzadatak može imati zabranjene troškove, predlažemo dijeliti BERT koder u svim tri podzadataka i definirati slojeve specifične zadataka na vrhu zajedničkog sloja. Ujedinjen model je onda obučen pod multi task učenjem okvira. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je: (1) Naša metoda prikupljanja na IR-u sposobna da efikasno prikupi kandidate kvalitetne kvalitete, tako omogućava da se naš metod lako prilagodi velikoj skali KB-a; (2) model BERT poboljšava preciznost u svim tri podzadatka; i (3) u koristi od učenja višezadataka, ujedinjeni model dobija daljnje poboljšanje sa samo 1/3 originalnih parametara. Naš konačni model postigne konkurentne rezultate na setu podataka jednostavnih pitanja i nadmoćnijim izvodima na setu podataka FreebaseQA.', 'az': "Bilim səhifələri üzərində cavab verən sual genellikle üç sub-task içindədir, məsələn məsələlərini keşfetmək, bağlantı və bağlantı keşfetmək. Bilim üssələrində olan böyük növlərin və ilişkilərin səbəbi olaraq, əvvəlki işlər arama alanını azaltmaq üçün çox sofistikli qaydalar və yalnız bir KB dəstəsini yada salmaq üçün işlədilər. Bu işdə, keşif bilgi alma (IR) metodları vasitəsilə KB'lərə istifadə etmək üçün geri alma və yenidən dərəcə alınmış kanalları daha güclü nöral a ğları ilə yenidən dərəcə qəbul edirik. Ön təhsil edilmiş BERT modeli kimi daha güclü nöral ağları ilə. Hər sub-task üçün müxtəlif BERT modeli təyin etmək üçün qadağan maliyyətlərə məcbur ola bilər, biz BERT kodlayıcını üç sub-task arasında paylaşmaq və paylaşılmış səmtin üstündə task-specific layers təyin etmək üçün təklif edirik. Birləşdirilmiş model sonra çoxlu işlər öyrənmə qurğusu altında təhsil edilir. İşləşmələr belə göstərir: (1) IR tabanlı alış metodumuz yüksək kaliteli kandidātları təşkil edə bilər, böylece bizim metodumuzun böyük ölçüdə KB-lərə asanlıqla uyğunlaşdırmağı mümkün edər; (2) BERT modeli üç işin altındakı dəqiqliyini yaxşılaşdırır; ( 3 ) çoxlu iş öyrənməsindən faydalanır, birləşdirilmiş modellər təkcə təkcə 1/3 parametrlərin daha yaxşılıqlarını alır. Bizim son modelimiz FreebaseQA veri qutusundakı SimpleQuestion veri qutusunda və üstün performansımızda müəllif sonuçlarına yetişir.", 'cs': 'Odpověď na otázky prostřednictvím znalostních bází (KBQA) obvykle zahrnuje tři dílčí úkoly, konkrétně detekci tématických entit, propojení entit a detekci vztahů. Vzhledem k velkému počtu entit a vztahů uvnitř znalostních bází (KB) předchozí práce obvykle využívala sofistikovaná pravidla pro zúžení vyhledávacího prostoru a spravovala pouze podmnožinu KBs v paměti. V této práci využíváme rámec retrieve-and-rerank pro přístup k KBs tradiční metodou vyhledávání informací (IR) a přehodnocujeme získané kandidáty s výkonnějšími neuronovými sítěmi, jako je předškolený model BERT. Vzhledem k tomu, že přímé přiřazení jiného modelu BERT pro každý dílčí úkol může vzniknout nepříliš náklady, navrhujeme sdílet BERT kodér napříč všemi třemi dílčími úkoly a definovat specifické vrstvy na vrcholu sdílené vrstvy. Jednotný model je pak trénován v rámci víceúlohového učebního rámce. Experimenty ukazují, že: (1) Naše metoda získávání kvalitních kandidátů na bázi IR je schopna efektivně shromažďovat vysoce kvalitní kandidáty, což umožňuje snadno adaptovat naši metodu na velké KBs; (2) model BERT zlepšuje přesnost všech tří dílčích úkolů; a (3) těží z víceúlohového učení, sjednocený model získává další zlepšení pouze s 1/3 původních parametrů. Náš konečný model dosahuje konkurenčních výsledků na datové sadě SimpleQuestions a vynikajícího výkonu na datové sadě FreebaseQA.', 'et': 'Küsimustele vastamine teadmistebaaside kaudu hõlmab tavaliselt kolme alamülesannet, nimelt teema olemi tuvastamine, olemi sidumine ja seoste tuvastamine. Kuna teadmistebaaside sisesed olemid ja suhted on suured, kasutasid varasemad tööd tavaliselt keerukaid reegleid otsinguruumi kitsendamiseks ja hallasid ainult mälus olevaid KBsid alamhulka. Käesolevas töös kasutame tagasivõtmise ja ümberpankimise raamistikku, et pääseda KB-dele juurde traditsioonilise informatsiooni tagasivõtmise (IR) meetodi kaudu, ning tagasivõetud kandidaadid järjestame ümber võimsamate närvivõrkudega, nagu näiteks eelkoolitud BERT mudel. Arvestades asjaolu, et iga allülesande jaoks erineva BERT mudeli otsene määramine võib põhjustada ülemääraseid kulusid, teeme ettepaneku jagada BERT kodeerija kõigi kolme allülesande vahel ja määratleda ülesandepõhised kihid jagatud kihi peale. Ühtne mudel koolitatakse seejärel mitmeülesandelise õppe raamistiku alusel. Eksperimentid näitavad, et: (1) meie IR-põhine tagasivõtmismeetod suudab tõhusalt koguda kvaliteetseid kandidaate, võimaldades seega meie meetodil lihtsalt kohaneda suuremahuliste KB-dega; (2) BERTi mudel parandab kõigi kolme allülesande täpsust; ja (3) mitme ülesandega õppimisest kasu saavad ühtsed mudelid täiendavad ainult 1/3 algsetest parameetritest. Meie lõplik mudel saavutab SimpleQuestions andmekogumi konkurentsivõimelised tulemused ja FreebaseQA andmekogumi suurepärase jõudluse.', 'fi': 'Tietokantojen kautta tapahtuvaan kysymyksiin vastaamiseen (KBQA) kuuluu yleensä kolme osatehtävää, jotka ovat aiheen entiteetin havaitseminen, entiteetin linkittäminen ja suhteiden havaitseminen. Tietokantojen (KB) sisällä olevien kokonaisuuksien ja suhteiden suuren määrän vuoksi aikaisemmassa työssä käytettiin yleensä kehittyneitä sääntöjä hakutilan kaventamiseen ja hallittiin vain osa muistissa olevista KB:istä. Tässä työssä hyödynnämme nouto- ja uudelleenpankkikehystä päästäksemme käsiksi KB:iin perinteisen tiedonhaun (IR) menetelmän avulla ja sijoitamme haetut ehdokkaat uudelleen tehokkaimmilla hermoverkoilla, kuten esikoulutetulla BERT-mallilla. Ottaen huomioon, että eri BERT-mallin määrittäminen kullekin osatehtävälle voi aiheuttaa kohtuuttomia kustannuksia, ehdotamme BERT-kooderin jakamista kaikkien kolmen osatehtävän kesken ja tehtäväkohtaisten tasojen määrittämistä jaetun kerroksen päälle. Yhtenäinen malli koulutetaan sitten monitehtävän oppimisen puitteissa. Kokeet osoittavat, että: (1) IR-pohjainen hakumenetelmä pystyy keräämään korkealaatuisia ehdokkaita tehokkaasti, joten menetelmämme mukautuu helposti suuriin KB-pisteisiin; (2) BERT-malli parantaa tarkkuutta kaikissa kolmessa osatehtävässä; ja (3) monitehtäväoppimista hyödyntävä yhtenäinen malli saa lisäparannuksia vain kolmasosalla alkuperäisistä parametreista. Lopullinen mallimme tuottaa kilpailukykyisiä tuloksia SimpleQuestions-aineistossa ja erinomaisen suorituskyvyn FreebaseQA-aineistossa.', 'ca': "La resposta a preguntes sobre les bases de coneixement (KBQA) normalment implica tres subtasques, a saber la detecció d'entitats temàtiques, l'enllaç d'entitats i la detecció de relacions. Gràcies al gran nombre d'entitats i relacions dins les bases de coneixement (KB), la feina anterior normalment utilitzava regles sofisticades per reduir l'espai de cerca i només gestiona un subconjunt de KB a la memòria. En aquesta feina, utilitzem un marc de recuperació i reconsideració per accedir a KB mitjançant el mètode tradicional de recuperació d'informació (IR), i reestructurem els candidats recuperats amb xarxes neurals més poderoses com el model BERT pré-entrenat. Tenint en compte el fet que assenyar directament un model BERT diferent per cada subtasca pot suportar costos prohibidors, proposem compartir un codificador BERT en totes les tres subtasques i definir capes específices per tasca sobre la capa compartida. El model unificat s'entrena sota un marc d'aprenentatge multitascat. Els experiments demostren que: (1) El nostre mètode de recuperació basat en IR és capaç de recollir candidats d'alta qualitat eficientment, permet així que el nostre mètode s'adapte fàcilment a KB a gran escala; (2) el model BERT millora la precisió en totes les tres subtasques; i (3) beneficiant de l'aprenentatge multitascat, el model unificat obté millores més amb només un terç dels paràmetres originals. El nostre model final aconsegueix resultats competitius en el conjunt de dades SimpleQuestions i un rendiment superior en el conjunt de dades FreebaseQA.", 'ha': "Socket error code ConnectionTimeout Dukan yawan abun da haɗi guda na salon da aka sani (KB), aiki na farko sun yi amfani da amfani da shiryoyin sofi masu amfani da ɗabi'a wa ƙaranci filin search kuma ya yi tafiyar da wata jama'a na KBs hukar tunan. Daga wannan aikin, Munã samun wata firam mai iya amfani da KBs tunkuɗe wa motsi na lãbãri (IR) da kuma za'a sake-ranar da waɗandasu da ke ƙaranci masu ƙarfin neural kamar shirin da ya yi zaman-yin-tunkuɗe BERT. Aka kula da gaskiya cẽwa, a daidaita wani misãlan BERT na dabam-daban wa kõwane sub-aikin, za'a iya ƙara nau'i, ko don mu buɗa kodi na BERT a kan duk abun uku kuma Mu ƙayyade ƙanshi na aikin-ƙayyade ƙanshi na haɗi. An sanar da shirin nuna shi a ƙarƙashin wani firam na-aikin aiki mai yawa. Fijararin na nuna cẽwa: (1) Shiryatin da ake samu a kan IR-asansa yana iya iya samun kandidayan masu tsari masu da amfani, don haka kuma yana iya amfani da metodenmu zuwa KBs mai girma; (2) Motdalin BERT ya ƙara tsari cikin duk taskõki uku; kuma yana da amfani daga karatun mulki-aikin, misalin wanda ya yi haɗi na sami yana iya samar kwamfyuta kawai da 1/3 cikin parameteri na farko. MataimakinMu na ƙarshen ya sami matsala masu yin gaugawa a kan database na Simle da mafi kyauta a kan dataset na Freebase QA.", 'he': 'עניין על שאלות על בסיסי ידע (KBQA) בדרך כלל מכיל שלושה משימות תת-משימות, כלומר זיהוי יחידות נושאית, קשר יחידה וגילוי יחסים. בגלל מספר גדול של ישויות ומערכות יחסים בתוך בסיסי הידע (KB), העבודה הקודמת בדרך כלל השתמשה בחוקים מתוחכמים כדי לצמצם את מרחב החיפוש והנהלה רק תחתונה של KB בזיכרון. בעבודה הזו, אנו משתמשים במסגרת השיגה-ושוב-הקשר כדי לגשת ל-KBs דרך שיטת השיגה של מידע מסורתי (IR), ולהגדיל מחדש מועמדים השיגים עם רשתות עצביות חזקות יותר כמו מודל BERT מאומן מראש. Considering the fact that directly assigning a different BERT model for each sub-task may incur prohibitive costs, we propose to share a BERT encoder across all three sub-tasks and define task-specific layers on top of the shared layer.  המודל המאוחד מאומן תחת מסגרת לימוד ממשימות רבות. ניסויים מראים כי: (1) שיטת השיגור שלנו מבוססת IR מסוגלת לאסוף מועמדים איכות גבוהה באופן יעיל, כך מאפשר השיטה שלנו להתאים לקי.בי.איי בקלות; (2) the BERT model improves the accuracy across all three sub-tasks;  והמודל המאוחד מקבל שיפורים נוספים עם רק 1/3 מהפרמטרים המקוריים. המודל הסופי שלנו משיג תוצאות תחרותיות על קבוצת נתונים של שאלות פשוטות והופעה העליונה על קבוצת נתונים FreebaseQA.', 'sk': 'Odgovarjanje na vprašanja v zvezi z bazami znanja (KBQA) običajno vključuje tri podnaloge, in sicer odkrivanje tematskih entitet, povezovanje entitet in odkrivanje relacij. Zaradi velikega števila entitet in relacij znotraj baz znanja (KB) so predhodna dela običajno uporabljala prefinjena pravila za zožitev iskalnega prostora in upravljala le podmnožico KB v pomnilniku. V tem delu smo izkoristili okvir za pridobivanje in ponovno bankiranje za dostop do KB prek tradicionalne metode pridobivanja informacij (IR) in ponovno razvrstili pridobljene kandidate z močnejšimi nevronskimi omrežji, kot je vnaprej usposobljen model BERT. Glede na dejstvo, da lahko neposredno dodeljevanje drugačnega modela BERT za vsako podopravilo povzroči precejšnje stroške, predlagamo, da se kodirnik BERT deli med vsemi tremi podopravili in na vrhu plasti skupne rabe določi plasti za posamezno opravilo. Enotni model se nato usposablja v okviru večopravilnega učenja. Poskusi kažejo, da: (1) Naša metoda iskanja, ki temelji na IR, lahko učinkovito zbira visokokakovostne kandidate in tako omogoča enostavno prilagajanje naši metodi velikim KB-jem; (2) model BERT izboljšuje natančnost vseh treh podnalog; in (3) s koristjo večopravilnega učenja enotni model dobi nadaljnje izboljšave s samo eno tretjino prvotnih parametrov. Naš končni model dosega konkurenčne rezultate na naboru podatkov SimpleQuestions in vrhunsko zmogljivost nabora podatkov FreebaseQA.', 'bo': 'Question answering over knowledge bases (KBQA) usually involves three sub-tasks, namely topic entity detection, entity linking and relation detection. Due to the large number of entities and relations inside knowledge bases (KB), previous work usually used sophisticated rules to narrow the search space and managed only a subset of KBs in memory. In this work, we leverage a retrieve-and-re rank framework to access KBs via traditional information retrieval (IR) method, and re-rank retrieved candidates with more powerful neural networks such as the pre-trained BERT model. BERT་རྣམ་གྲངས་སུ་རེ་རེར་མི་འདྲ་བ་དེ་ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ལས་འཆར་ཆོག་པ་ཞིག་ཏུ་འཇུག་དགོས་པ་ཡིན་ན། ང་ཚོས་BERT་ཨིན་ཀོ་ཌར་རྣམ་པ་གྲངས་ལས་sub-tasks་གསུམ་ གཅིག་མཐུན་པའི་མ་དབུགས་དེ་ལས་སྣ་མང་བོའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཤེས་ཀྱི་གཞུང་ཚབ་ལ་བསླབས་བྱུང་། Experiments show that: (1) Our IR-based retrieval method is able to collect high-quality candidates efficiently, thus enables our method adapt to large-scale KBs easily; and (2) BERT མ་དབྱིབས་བཀོད་སྤྱོད་གྱིས་བདེ་འཇལ་རིས་དུས་ལས་ཀ་གསུམ་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་། and (3) benefiting from multi-task learning, the unified model obtains further improvements with only 1/3 of the original parameters. ང་ཚོའི་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་མ་དབྱིབས', 'jv': 'color-profile-policy Kernel: Nang barêng-barêng iki, kita jewis akèh paneelbah tanggal ngêngguna sistem sing di ngêngguna kbs ngono ngêngguna ngêngguna sistem Tradisyonel informasi retewal Coffens Sampeyan jejer-jejer mbubuti podho kelas rampun multi-task Name (2) The BERT model nyebute akèh barêng-barêng langgar saben telu task; Y model sing ngwala macem gawe mbut dadi sing perusahaan ning dataset Simplequestion lan akeh sisan karo perusahaan maneh ning freebazqA dataset'}
{'en': 'Implicitly Abusive Comparisons   A New Dataset and Linguistic Analysis', 'ar': 'مقارنات مسيئة ضمنيًا - مجموعة بيانات جديدة وتحليل لغوي', 'fr': 'Comparaisons implicitement abusives\xa0: un nouveau jeu de données et une nouvelle analyse linguistique', 'pt': 'Comparações Implicitamente Abusivas – Um Novo Conjunto de Dados e Análise Linguística', 'es': 'Comparaciones implícitamente abusivas: un nuevo conjunto de datos y análisis lingüístico', 'zh': '隐式滥用较 – 新数集语析', 'ja': '暗黙の虐待的比較–新しいデータセットと言語学的分析', 'hi': 'स्पष्ट रूप से अपमानजनक तुलना - एक नया डेटासेट और भाषाई विश्लेषण', 'ru': 'Неявно злоупотребляющие сравнения – новый набор данных и лингвистический анализ', 'ga': 'Comparáidí atá go hintuigthe maslach – Tacar Sonraí Nua agus Anailís Teangeolaíoch', 'ka': 'Implicitly Abusive Comparisons - A New Dataset and Linguistic Analysis', 'hu': 'Implicitáltan visszaélő összehasonlítások - Új adatkészlet és nyelvi elemzés', 'el': 'Εννοούμενα καταχρηστικές συγκρίσεις.Νέο σύνολο δεδομένων και γλωσσική ανάλυση', 'it': 'Confronti implicitamente abusivi - Un nuovo set di dati e analisi linguistica', 'mk': 'Implicitly Abusive Comparisons - A New Dataset and Linguistic Analysis', 'kk': 'Келтірілген жеңіл салыстырулар - Жаңа деректер бағдарлама және лингвистикалық анализ', 'lt': 'Tiksliai piktnaudžiaujantys palyginimai – naujas duomenų rinkinys ir kalbų analizė', 'ms': 'Comparison Abusive Implicitly - A New Dataset and Language Analysis', 'ml': 'Implicitly Abusive Comparisons - A New Dataset and Linguistic Analysis', 'mt': "Tqabbil Abużiv Impliċitament - Sett ta' Dejta Ġdid u Analiżi Lingwistika", 'mn': 'Шинэ өгөгдлийн сан болон хэлбэрийн шинжилгээ', 'no': 'Implicit Abusive Comparisons - Eit ny databaser og Linguistic Analysis', 'ro': 'Comparații abuzive implicite - un nou set de date și analiză lingvistică', 'pl': 'Dorozumienie nadużywające porównania wA Nowy zestaw danych i analiza językowa', 'sr': 'Implicitno zloupotrebne usporedbe - Novi analiz podataka i lingvističke analize', 'si': 'විශේෂයෙන් අභික්\u200dරීය සම්පූර්ණය - අළුත් දත්ත සහ ලින්ගුසික විශ්ලේෂණය', 'so': 'Implicitly Abusive Comparisons - A New Dataset and Linguistic Analysis', 'sv': 'Implicit missbrukande jämförelser - En ny dataset och språklig analys', 'ta': 'Implicitly Abusive Comparisons - A New Dataset and Linguistic Analysis', 'ur': 'اثبات سے زیادتی مقابلہ - ایک نیا ڈاٹا سٹ اور لینگیستیک تحلیل', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Rõ ràng có mâu thuẫn "Một bộ dữ liệu mới và phân tích ngôn ngữ"', 'bg': 'Инцидентно злоупотребяващи сравнения - нов набор от данни и лингвистичен анализ', 'da': 'Implicit misbrug sammenligninger - Et nyt datasæt og sproglig analyse', 'nl': 'Impliciet misbruikende vergelijkingen sEen nieuwe dataset en taalkundige analyse', 'hr': 'Implicitno Abusivne usporedbe - Nova analiza podataka i lingvističke analize', 'de': 'Implizit missbräuchliche Vergleiche seEin neuer Datensatz und linguistische Analyse', 'fa': 'مقایسه\u200cهای ناتوانی - یک تحلیل داده\u200cهای جدید و لینگیستیک', 'ko': '스텔스 남용 비교 - 새로운 데이터 집합과 언어 분석', 'id': 'Perbandingan Abusive Implicitly - A New Dataset and Linguistic Analysis', 'tr': 'Implicitly Abusive Comparisons - A New Data aset and Linguistic Analysis', 'sw': 'Kulinganisha na Ubusive - Taarifa mpya na Uchambuzi wa Kilinguistic', 'sq': 'Krahasime implicitet abuzive - Një bazë të dhënash të re dhe analizë gjuhësore', 'am': 'አዲስ ዳታ ሰርቨር እና Linguistic Analysis', 'bn': 'Implicitly Abusive Comparisons - A New Dataset and Linguistic Analysis', 'hy': 'Միմաստորեն չարաշահույթ համեմատություններ - Նոր տվյալների համակարգ և լեզվաբանական վերլուծություն', 'af': "Implisief Abusive Vergelykings - ' n Nuwe Dataset en Linguistiese Analisie", 'ca': 'Comparacions abusives implícites - Un nou conjunt de dades i anàlisi lingüístic', 'bs': 'Implicitno zloupotrebne usporedbe - Nova analiza podataka i lingvističke analize', 'az': '∆èslind…ô Abusive Comparisons - Yeni Veril…ôn v…ô Linguistik Analizi', 'fi': 'Implicitely Abusive Comparisons - A New Dataset and Linguistic Analysis', 'et': 'Kaudselt kuritarvitavad võrdlused - uus andmekogum ja keeleline analüüs', 'cs': 'Implicitně zneužívající srovnání', 'jv': 'Intlicitly', 'sk': 'Implicitivno zlorabljene primerjave - nov nabor podatkov in jezikovna analiza', 'he': 'שיווחים מועללים באופן מילוי - קבוצת נתונים חדשה וניתוח לינגליסטי', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Implicitly Abusive Comparisons - A New Dataset and Linguistic Analysis'}
{'en': 'We examine the task of detecting implicitly abusive comparisons (e.g. Your hair looks like you have been electrocuted). Implicitly abusive comparisons are abusive comparisons in which abusive words (e.g. dumbass or scum) are absent. We detail the process of creating a novel dataset for this task via crowdsourcing that includes several measures to obtain a sufficiently representative and unbiased set of comparisons. We also present classification experiments that include a range of linguistic features that help us better understand the mechanisms underlying abusive comparisons.', 'es': 'Examinamos la tarea de detectar comparaciones implícitamente abusivas (por ejemplo, «Parece que tu cabello se ha electrocutado»). Las comparaciones implícitamente abusivas son comparaciones abusivas en las que no hay palabras abusivas (por ejemplo, «tonta» o «escoria»). Detallamos el proceso de creación de un conjunto de datos novedoso para esta tarea a través del crowdsourcing que incluye varias medidas para obtener un conjunto de comparaciones suficientemente representativo e imparcial. También presentamos experimentos de clasificación que incluyen una serie de características lingüísticas que nos ayudan a entender mejor los mecanismos que subyacen a las comparaciones abusivas.', 'ja': '私たちは、暗黙の虐待的な比較を検出するタスクを検討します（例：「あなたの髪は感電死したように見えます」）。暗黙的に罵倒する比較は、罵倒的な言葉（例えば、「バカ」または「クズ」）が存在しない罵倒的な比較です。私たちは、十分に代表的で偏りのない比較セットを得るためのいくつかの尺度を含む、クラウドソーシングを介してこのタスクのための新しいデータセットを作成するプロセスを詳細に説明します。また、虐待的比較の根底にあるメカニズムをよりよく理解するのに役立つ言語学的特徴の範囲を含む分類実験も提示している。', 'ar': 'نحن نفحص مهمة الكشف عن المقارنات المسيئة ضمنيًا (على سبيل المثال ، "يبدو شعرك وكأنك تعرضت للصعق بالكهرباء"). المقارنات المسيئة ضمنيًا هي مقارنات مسيئة تغيب فيها الكلمات المسيئة (مثل "dumbass" أو "حثالة"). نقوم بتفصيل عملية إنشاء مجموعة بيانات جديدة لهذه المهمة من خلال التعهيد الجماعي الذي يتضمن عدة تدابير للحصول على مجموعة مقارنات تمثيلية وغير متحيزة بشكل كافٍ. نقدم أيضًا تجارب تصنيف تتضمن مجموعة من الميزات اللغوية التي تساعدنا على فهم أفضل للآليات الكامنة وراء المقارنات المسيئة.', 'zh': '检点隐滥(如"汝发若电死")。 隐诟滥性,无诟詈词语(如"笨蛋"、"败类")。 备言因众包创一新集,备数事,以得一组足以比代表性公。 又条上分类实验,其一系语言特征,助我更知滥用较后机。', 'fr': "Nous examinons la tâche de détection des comparaisons implicitement abusives (par exemple «\xa0Vos cheveux semblent avoir été électrocutés\xa0»). Les comparaisons implicitement abusives sont des comparaisons abusives dans lesquelles les mots abusifs (par exemple «\xa0stupide\xa0» ou «\xa0racaille\xa0») sont absents. Nous détaillons le processus de création d'un nouveau jeu de données pour cette tâche via le crowdsourcing qui inclut plusieurs mesures pour obtenir un ensemble de comparaisons suffisamment représentatif et impartial. Nous présentons également des expériences de classification qui incluent une gamme de caractéristiques linguistiques qui nous aident à mieux comprendre les mécanismes sous-jacents aux comparaisons abusives.", 'pt': 'Examinamos a tarefa de detectar comparações implicitamente abusivas (por exemplo, “Seu cabelo parece que você foi eletrocutado”). Comparações implicitamente abusivas são comparações abusivas nas quais palavras abusivas (por exemplo, “idiota” ou “escória”) estão ausentes. Detalhamos o processo de criação de um novo conjunto de dados para essa tarefa via crowdsourcing que inclui várias medidas para obter um conjunto de comparações suficientemente representativo e imparcial. Também apresentamos experimentos de classificação que incluem uma série de características linguísticas que nos ajudam a entender melhor os mecanismos subjacentes a comparações abusivas.', 'ga': 'Scrúdaímid an tasc a bhaineann le comparáidí atá intuigthe go maslach a bhrath (m.sh. “Tá an chuma ar do chuid gruaige gur leictriú tú”). Is éard is comparáidí maslacha intuigthe ann ná comparáidí maslacha ina bhfuil focail maslacha (m.sh. “dumbass” nó “scum”) as láthair. Déanaimid mionsonrú ar an bpróiseas chun tacar sonraí nua a chruthú don tasc seo trí sluafhoinsiú a chuimsíonn roinnt beart chun tacar comparáidí atá ionadaíoch agus neamhchlaonta a fháil. Cuirimid turgnaimh aicmithe i láthair freisin a chuimsíonn raon de ghnéithe teangeolaíochta a chabhraíonn linn tuiscint níos fearr a fháil ar na meicníochtaí is bun le comparáidí maslacha.', 'ru': 'Мы изучаем задачу обнаружения неявно оскорбительных сравнений (например, «Ваши волосы выглядят так, как будто вас ударили током»). Косвенно оскорбительные сравнения - это оскорбительные сравнения, в которых оскорбительные слова (например, "тупица" или "подонок") отсутствуют. Мы детализируем процесс создания нового набора данных для этой задачи с помощью краудсорсинга, который включает в себя несколько мер для получения достаточно репрезентативного и объективного набора сравнений. Мы также представляем классификационные эксперименты, которые включают ряд лингвистических особенностей, которые помогают нам лучше понять механизмы, лежащие в основе оскорбительных сравнений.', 'hi': 'हम स्पष्ट रूप से अपमानजनक तुलनाओं का पता लगाने के कार्य की जांच करते हैं (उदाहरण के लिए "आपके बाल ऐसा लगता है कि आपको इलेक्ट्रोकट किया गया है")। स्पष्ट रूप से अपमानजनक तुलनाएं अपमानजनक तुलनाएं हैं जिनमें अपमानजनक शब्द (जैसे "डंबस" या "मैल") अनुपस्थित हैं। हम क्राउडसोर्सिंग के माध्यम से इस कार्य के लिए एक उपन्यास डेटासेट बनाने की प्रक्रिया का विस्तार करते हैं जिसमें तुलना के पर्याप्त प्रतिनिधि और निष्पक्ष सेट प्राप्त करने के लिए कई उपाय शामिल हैं। हम वर्गीकरण प्रयोगों को भी प्रस्तुत करते हैं जिनमें भाषाई विशेषताओं की एक श्रृंखला शामिल है जो हमें अपमानजनक तुलना के अंतर्निहित तंत्र को बेहतर ढंग से समझने में मदद करती है।', 'ka': "ჩვენ შევხედავთ საქმე, რომელსაც ინტელექტურად ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან დამწყვეტილებელი შემთხვევაში (მაგალითად. 'თქვენი ფესები გამოიყურება, როგორც თქვენ ელ იმპლექტიურად ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან შემდგომარება არის ძალიან შემდგომარება, რომელიც ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან სიტყვები (მაგალითად: 'dumbass' ან 'scum') არსებობენ ჩვენ დავიწყებთ პროცესის შექმნა პროცესი პროცესი ამ დავალებისთვის პროცესი პროცესი, რომელიც აქვს რამდენიმე მოწყობილობა, რომელიც საკუთარ მნიშვნელოვანი და არა ჩვენ ასევე კლასიფიკაციის ექსპერიმენტები გამოყენებთ, რომლებიც უფრო უფრო უფრო გავიგეთ მაქსინტები, რომლებიც უფრო ძალიან ძალიან შემდგენებელ", 'hu': 'Megvizsgáljuk a hallgatólagosan visszaélő összehasonlítások kimutatásának feladatát (pl. "A haja úgy néz ki, mintha áramütést kapott volna"). Az implicit visszaélő összehasonlítások visszaélő összehasonlítások olyan visszaélő összehasonlítások, amelyekben a visszaélő szavak (pl. "hülye" vagy "söpredék") hiányoznak. Részletesen részletezzük az új adatkészlet létrehozásának folyamatát a crowdsourcing segítségével, amely számos intézkedést tartalmaz az összehasonlítások kellően reprezentatív és elfogulatlan összehasonlításához. Olyan osztályozási kísérleteket is bemutatunk, amelyek számos nyelvi jellemzőt tartalmaznak, amelyek segítenek jobban megérteni a visszaélő összehasonlítások mögötti mechanizmusokat.', 'el': 'Εξετάζουμε το καθήκον της ανίχνευσης έμμεσων καταχρηστικών συγκρίσεων (π.χ. "Τα μαλλιά σας μοιάζουν με ηλεκτροπληξία"). Οι έμμεσα καταχρηστικές συγκρίσεις είναι καταχρηστικές συγκρίσεις στις οποίες απουσιάζουν καταχρηστικές λέξεις (π.χ. "βλάκας" ή "αποβράσματα"). Διευκρινίζουμε λεπτομερώς τη διαδικασία δημιουργίας ενός νέου συνόλου δεδομένων για αυτό το έργο μέσω της που περιλαμβάνει διάφορα μέτρα για να ληφθεί ένα επαρκώς αντιπροσωπευτικό και αμερόληπτο σύνολο συγκρίσεων. Παρουσιάζουμε επίσης πειράματα ταξινόμησης που περιλαμβάνουν μια σειρά γλωσσικών χαρακτηριστικών που μας βοηθούν να κατανοήσουμε καλύτερα τους μηχανισμούς που διέπουν τις καταχρηστικές συγκρίσεις.', 'it': 'Esaminiamo il compito di rilevare confronti implicitamente abusivi (ad esempio "I tuoi capelli sembrano essere stati fulminati"). I confronti implicitamente abusivi sono confronti abusivi in cui mancano parole abusive (ad esempio "idiota" o "feccia"). Approfondiamo il processo di creazione di un nuovo set di dati per questo compito tramite crowdsourcing che include diverse misure per ottenere un insieme sufficientemente rappresentativo e imparziale di confronti. Presentiamo anche esperimenti di classificazione che includono una serie di caratteristiche linguistiche che ci aiutano a comprendere meglio i meccanismi alla base dei confronti abusivi.', 'kk': "Мысалы, сіздердің салыстырылып тұрған электрондық салыстыруларды анықтау тапсырмасын тексереміз. Қатысушылық салыстырылуы - қорқынышты сөздер (мысалы, 'dumbass' немесе 'scum') жоқ. Біз бұл тапсырманың романдық деректер жинағын құру процесін көпшілік көпшілігімен бірнеше мәліметті салыстыру үшін жеткілікті және салыстырылмаған жинақтарды жасау үшін тегже Мұндай-ақ біз басқа тілдік мүмкіндіктерін таңдап көреміз. Бұл тілдік мүмкіндіктері бізге жақсы түсінуге көмектеседі.", 'lt': "Mes nagrinėjame užduotį nustatyti netiesiogiai piktnaudžiaujamus palyginimus (pvz. 'Jūsų plaukai atrodo, kad jūs buvote elektrocutuoti'). Tiksliai piktnaudžiaujami palyginimai yra piktnaudžiaujami palyginimai, kuriuose nėra piktnaudžiaujamų žodžių (pvz., dumbass arba scum). Išsamiai apibūdiname šios užduoties naujo duomenų rinkinio kūrimo procesą naudojant visuomenės išteklius, kuriame numatytos kelios priemonės, skirtos pakankamai atstovaujantiems ir nešališkiems palyginimams gauti. Taip pat pristatome klasifikavimo eksperimentus, apimančius įvairias kalbines savybes, padedančias mums geriau suprasti piktnaudžiaujamų palyginimų mechanizmus.", 'mk': "Ја проверуваме задачата за детектирање имплицитно злоупотребни споредби (np. „Вашата коса изгледа како да сте биле електрикутирани“). Implicitly abusive comparisons are abusive comparisons in which abusive words (e.g. 'dumbass' or 'scum') are absent.  Ние го деталираме процесот на создавање нови податоци за оваа задача преку пулсурсирање кој вклучува неколку мерки за добивање доволно претставнички и непристрасни споредби. Исто така, претставуваме експерименти за класификација кои вклучуваат голем број јазички карактеристики кои ни помагаат подобро да ги разбереме механизмите на кои се наоѓаат злоупотребите.", 'ms': "We examine the task of detecting implicitly abusive comparisons (e.g. 'Your hair looks like you have been electrocuted').  Perbandingan yang melampaui batas adalah perbandingan yang melampaui batas yang mana perkataan yang melampaui batas (cth. 'dumbass' atau 'scum') tidak ada. Kami perincian proses mencipta set data baru untuk tugas ini melalui crowdsourcing yang termasuk beberapa tindakan untuk mendapatkan set perbandingan yang cukup mewakili dan tidak bias. Kami juga mempersembahkan eksperimen klasifikasi yang termasuk julat ciri-ciri bahasa yang membantu kita memahami lebih baik mekanisme yang mengandungi perbandingan yang melampaui batas.", 'ml': "നിങ്ങളുടെ മുടി നിങ്ങള്\u200d വൈദ്യോക്ടോക്ക് ചെയ്തിരിക്കുന്നു എന്ന് തോന്നുന്നു. അധികാരികമായ തുല്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപദ്രവിക്കുന്ന തുല്യമാണ്. അതില്\u200d അപകടത്തിന്റെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d (ഉദാഹരണമായ 'ഡംബസ്' അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d 'കുഴിമാനം ഈ ജോലിയ്ക്കുള്ള നോവല്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസേറ്റ് ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രതിനിധിയും പിന്തുണയ്ക്കാത്ത ത ത ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കേഷന്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഇപ്പോള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നുണ്ട്. ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തിലുള്ള ഒരുപാട് പ്രശ്നങ്ങളുണ്ട്.", 'mt': "We examine the task of detecting implicitly abusive comparisons (e.g. 'Your hair looks like you have been electrocuted').  Implicitly abusive comparisons are abusive comparisons in which abusive words (e.g. 'dumbass' or 'scum') are absent.  We detail the process of creating a novel dataset for this task via crowdsourcing that includes several measures to obtain a sufficiently representative and unbiased set of comparisons.  We also present classification experiments that include a range of linguistic features that help us better understand the mechanisms underlying abusive comparisons.", 'mn': 'Бид хохиромжтой харьцуулалтыг олох үйлдлийг шалгаж байна (жишээ нь "үс чинь цахилгаан халдвар авсан шиг харагдаж байна"). Хүчирхийлэлтэй харьцуулалт нь хүчирхийлэлтэй харьцуулалт юм. Хүчирхийлэлтэй үг (жишээ нь \'тѳлбѳлбѳлбѳлбѳлбѳлбѳлбѳлбѳлбѳлбѳлбѳлбѳлбѳл Бид энэ ажлын шинэ өгөгдлийн санг олон хүмүүсийн сэтгэл хөрөнгө оруулахын тулд хэдэн шаардлагатай хэмжээсүүдтэй харьцуулахын тулд хангалттай төлөөлөгч, харьцуулахгүй хэмжээсүүд гаргадаг. Мөн бид хэл хэлний чадваруудыг илүү ойлгоход тусалдаг хуваалцааны туршилтуудыг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Vi undersøker oppgåva for å finna implisitt abusive sammenlikningar (f.eks. «Håret ditt ser ut som du har blitt elektrisk brukt»). Implisert abusive sammenligningar er abusive sammenligningar der abusive ord (f.eks. « dumbass » eller « scum ») er ikkje i staden. Vi detaljerer prosessen for å laga eit nytt dataset for denne oppgåva via crowdsourcing som inneheld fleire mål for å få nok representante og ugjennomsiktig sammenlikningar. Vi presenterer også klassifikasjonsperimentar som inkluderer eit rekke lingviske funksjonar som hjelper oss bedre å forstå mekanismene som underligg abusive sammenlikningar.', 'pl': 'Badamy zadanie wykrywania ukrytych porównań (np. "Twoje włosy wyglądają jakbyś został porażony prądem"). Porównania domyślnie nadużywające są nadużywającymi porównaniami, w których brakuje obraźliwych słów (np. "głupek" lub "szumowina"). Szczegółowo opisujemy proces tworzenia nowego zbioru danych do tego zadania za pomocą crowdsourcingu, który obejmuje kilka środków, aby uzyskać wystarczająco reprezentatywny i bezstronny zestaw porównań. Przedstawiamy również eksperymenty klasyfikacyjne, które obejmują szereg cech językowych, które pomagają nam lepiej zrozumieć mechanizmy leżące u podstaw nadużyć porównań.', 'ro': 'Examinăm sarcina detectării comparațiilor implicite abuzive (de exemplu, "Părul tău arată ca și cum ai fost electrocutat"). Comparațiile abuzive implicit sunt comparații abuzive în care cuvintele abuzive (de exemplu, "prost" sau "gunoi") lipsesc. Detalizăm procesul de creare a unui set de date nou pentru această sarcină prin crowdsourcing, care include mai multe măsuri pentru a obține un set suficient de reprezentativ și imparțial de comparații. De asemenea, prezentăm experimente de clasificare care includ o serie de caracteristici lingvistice care ne ajută să înțelegem mai bine mecanismele care stau la baza comparațiilor abuzive.', 'sr': 'Pregledali smo zadatak otkrivanja implicitno zlostavljajućih usporedba (npr. \'Vaša kosa izgleda kao da ste electrocuted\'). Implicitno zloupotrebne usporedbe su zloupotrebne usporedbe u kojima su nestale zloupotrebne reči (npr. "glupi" ili "smeće"). Mi detaljno objašnjavamo proces stvaranja novog set a podataka za ovaj zadatak putem crowdsourcing koji uključuje nekoliko mjera za dobivanje dovoljno reprezentativnog i nepristrasnog seta usporedba. Takođe predstavljamo klasifikacijske eksperimente koji uključuju niz jezičkih karakteristika koji nam pomažu bolje razumeti mehanizme pod nasilnim usporedbama.', 'si': "අපි පරීක්ෂා කරනවා විශ්වාසයෙන් විශ්වාසයෙන් විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා (උදාහරණයෙන් 'ඔයාගේ කෙස් පේන්නේ ඔයා විද විශේෂයෙන් අපරාධික විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ ව අපි මේ වැඩේ සඳහා නියම දත්ත සූදානයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාව විස්තර කරන්න ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාව සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා සමහර විසින් අ අපි පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණාවක් තියෙන්නේ ඒ වගේම භාෂාවික විශේෂතාවක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් වගේම අපිට උ", 'so': "Waxaan baaritaannaa shaqada la ogaanayo tusaale ahaan noocyada isticmaalka (tusaale ahaan timahaaga waxaa loola jeedaa inaad koronto) Tusaararka waxyeellada ah waa tusaale ahaan waxyeello caadi ah, kuwaas oo ay ka maqnaayaan hadallo caafimaad ah (tusaale ahaan 'dumbass' ama 'scum'). Waxaannu u qoraynaa baaritaanka sameynta macluumaadka warqadda ee shaqada via koorasyada dadweynaha, kaas oo ku jira qiyaastii ku filan ee uu helo wakiil ku filan iyo isbardhigyo kala duduwan. Sidoo kale waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa imtixaanka fasaxda, kuwaas oo ku jira heer luuqad oo kala duduwan, kuwaas oo inaga caawinaya inay si wanaagsan u fahamaan qaabilaadaha isticmaalka ah.", 'ta': "நாங்கள் கண்டுபிடிக்கும் செயலை தீவிரமான ஒப்புக்களை கண்டறிதல் (உதாரணமாக 'உங்கள் முடி நீங்கள் மின்னஞ்சல் வெளியேற்றப்பட் கொடுக்கும் ஒப்புக்கள் தீவிரமான ஒப்பீடுகளாக இருக்கிறது அதில் குற்றமான வார்த்தைகள் (உதாரணமாக 'dumbass' அல்லது 'scum' இல்லை. நாம் இந்த பணிக்கான புதிய தகவல் அமைப்பை உருவாக்கும் செயல்பாட்டை விளக்குகிறோம் மக்கள் மூலங்கள் மூலம் அது போதுமான பிரதிநிதியாளர்  நாம் இப்பொழுது வகுப்பு சோதனைகளைக் கொண்டு இருக்கிறோம். இது மொழியில் சில குணங்களைச் சேர்க்கிறது அது எங்களுக்கு நன்றாக புர", 'sv': 'Vi undersöker uppgiften att upptäcka underförstått kränkande jämförelser (t.ex. "Ditt hår ser ut som om du har fått en elektrisk stöt"). Implicit missbrukande jämförelser är missbrukande jämförelser där missbrukande ord (t.ex. "dumbass" eller "avskum") saknas. Vi beskriver processen att skapa en ny datauppsättning för denna uppgift via crowdsourcing som innehåller flera åtgärder för att få en tillräckligt representativ och opartisk uppsättning jämförelser. Vi presenterar även klassificeringsexperiment som innehåller en rad språkliga egenskaper som hjälper oss att bättre förstå mekanismerna bakom missbrukande jämförelser.', 'ur': "ہم اس کام کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ آپ کو الکتروکیٹ ڈال دیا گیا ہے۔ بالکل زبردستی مثالیں زبردستی مثالیں ہیں جن میں زبردستی کلمات (مثال 'dumbass' یا 'scum') غائب ہیں. ہم نے اس کام کے لئے ایک نئی ڈیٹ سٹ بنانے کی پروسس کا تفصیل کر دیا ہے کہ جمعیت سورسینگ کے ذریعہ بہت سی اندازے شامل ہیں کہ ایک کافی نمایندار اور ناپسندیدہ مقایسات حاصل کریں۔ ہم نے بھی کلاسیفوں کی آزمائش پیش کیے ہیں جن میں زبان شناسی کی مختلف موجودات شامل ہوتی ہیں جو ہمیں بہتر سمجھنے کی مدد کرتی ہیں ان مکانیزینوں کے نیچے ذلیل مقایسات کی وجہ سے۔", 'uz': 'Biz tashkilotni aniqlashni o\'rganamiz. Masalan, chong\'zingizni elektr\'atga ega bo\'lganligingizni ko\'rayapmiz. Ko\'pchilik misollarini tahrirlash misollaridir. Masalan "dumbass" yoki "scum" mavjud emas. Bu vazifa uchun novel maʼlumotlar tarkibini yaratish jarayonini bajaramiz. Bu muammolar uchun yetarli taʼminlovchiga ega bo\'lgan bir necha taklif qiladi. We also present classification experiments that include a range of linguistic features that help us better understand the mechanisms underlying abusive comparisons.', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi kiểm tra nhiệm vụ giám định bằng chứng có tính xấu hay không (ví dụ: "Tóc của bạn trông như bạn đã bị điện giật) Sự so sánh lạm dụng có vẻ là những đối tượng lạm dụng mà không có từ dùng (v.d. "đồ đần" hay "cặn bã). Chúng tôi chi tiết quá trình tạo ra một bộ dữ liệu mới cho nhiệm vụ này bằng cách thâm nhập vào nhiều biện pháp có đủ đại diện và không phân biệt được các cuộc so sánh. Chúng tôi cũng đưa ra các thí nghiệm phân loại gồm một loạt các yếu tố ngôn ngữ giúp chúng tôi hiểu rõ các cơ chế để so sánh lạm dụng.', 'nl': "We onderzoeken de taak om impliciet misbruikende vergelijkingen op te sporen (bijvoorbeeld 'Je haar ziet eruit alsof je bent geëlektrocuteerd'). Impliciet misbruikende vergelijkingen zijn misbruikende vergelijkingen waarin misbruikende woorden (bijvoorbeeld 'dombass' of 'uitschot') ontbreken. We beschrijven het proces van het creëren van een nieuwe dataset voor deze taak via crowdsourcing die verschillende maatregelen omvat om een voldoende representatieve en onpartijdige set van vergelijkingen te verkrijgen. We presenteren ook classificatieexperimenten die een reeks taalkundige kenmerken bevatten die ons helpen de mechanismen die ten grondslag liggen aan misbruikvergelijkingen beter te begrijpen.", 'de': 'Wir untersuchen die Aufgabe, implizit missbräuchliche Vergleiche zu erkennen (z.B. "Ihr Haar sieht aus, als ob Sie einen Stromschlag erlitten haben"). Implizit missbräuchliche Vergleiche sind missbräuchliche Vergleiche, bei denen missbräuchliche Wörter (z.B. "Dummkopf" oder "Abschaum") fehlen. Wir beschreiben den Prozess der Erstellung eines neuen Datensatzes für diese Aufgabe mittels Crowdsourcing, der mehrere Maßnahmen umfasst, um eine ausreichend repräsentative und unvoreingenommene Reihe von Vergleichen zu erhalten. Außerdem stellen wir Klassifizierungsexperimente vor, die eine Reihe von linguistischen Merkmalen beinhalten, die uns helfen, die Mechanismen, die missbräuchlichen Vergleichen zugrunde liegen, besser zu verstehen.', 'bg': 'Проучваме задачата за откриване на имплицитно злоупотребяващи сравнения (напр. "Косата ви изглежда сякаш сте били ударени от ток"). Инцидентно злоупотребяващи сравнения са злоупотребяващи сравнения, при които липсват злоупотребяващи думи (напр. "глупак" или "отрепка"). Ние подробно описваме процеса на създаване на нов набор от данни за тази задача чрез crowdsourcing, който включва няколко мерки за получаване на достатъчно представителен и безпристрастен набор от сравнения. Представяме и експерименти за класификация, които включват набор от лингвистични характеристики, които ни помагат да разберем по-добре механизмите в основата на злоупотребяващите сравнения.', 'da': 'Vi undersøger opgaven med at opdage implicit misbrugende sammenligninger (f.eks. "Dit hår ser ud, som om du er blevet ramt af stød"). Implicit misbrugende sammenligninger er misbrugende sammenligninger, hvor misbrugende ord (f.eks. "dumbass" eller "afskum") er fraværende. Vi detaljerer processen med at skabe et nyt datasæt til denne opgave via crowdsourcing, der omfatter flere foranstaltninger til at opnå et tilstrækkeligt repræsentativt og objektivt sæt af sammenligninger. Vi præsenterer også klassifikationseksperimenter, der omfatter en række sproglige funktioner, der hjælper os med bedre at forstå mekanismerne bag misbrug af sammenligninger.', 'hr': "Pregledali smo zadatak otkrivanja implicitno zlostavljajućih usporedba (npr. 'Vaša kosa izgleda kao da ste bili električni'). Implicitno zloupotrebne usporedbe su zloupotrebne usporedbe u kojima su nestale zloupotrebne riječi (npr. „gluposti“ ili „gluposti“). Mi detaljno objašnjavamo proces stvaranja novog set a podataka za ovaj zadatak putem crowdsourcing koji uključuje nekoliko mjera za dobivanje dovoljno reprezentativnog i nepristrasnog seta usporedba. Također predstavljamo klasifikacijske eksperimente koji uključuju niz jezičkih karakteristika koji nam pomažu bolje razumjeti mehanizme pod nasilnim usporedbama.", 'fa': 'ما وظیفه\u200cای را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که در مقایسه\u200cهای مختلف (مثلاً موهایتان به نظر می\u200cرسد که شما الکتروپیتان شده\u200cاید) پیدا کنید. مقایسه\u200cهای تجاوز به طور کامل، مقایسه\u200cهای تجاوز و تجاوز هستند که کلمات تجاوز (مثال «احمق» یا «آشغال») در آن وجود ندارند. ما روش ساختن یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای نوی برای این کار را با طریق سرمایه\u200cگذاری گروهی تفصیل می\u200cکنیم که شامل چند اندازه\u200cای است تا یک مجموعه\u200cی مقایسه\u200cها را به اندازه کافی نمایش\u200cدهنده و غیرقابل توجه کنیم ما همچنین آزمایش\u200cهای مختصری را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که شامل یک مجموعه ویژه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی است که به ما کمک می\u200cکند که مکانیسم\u200cهای زیر مقایسه\u200cهای تجاوز را بفهمیم.', 'ko': "우리는 함축적인 학대성 비교를 측정하는 임무를 연구했다. (예를 들어 네 머리카락이 감전된 것처럼 보인다.)함축적인 욕설성 비교는 욕설성 단어(예를 들어'dumbass'나'scum')가 없는 욕설성 비교를 가리킨다.우리는 패키지를 통해 이 임무를 위해 새로운 데이터 집합을 만드는 과정을 상세하게 소개했다. 이 데이터 집합은 몇 가지 조치를 포함하여 충분한 대표성과 편견이 없는 비교를 얻을 수 있다.우리는 또한 일련의 언어 특징을 포함하여 비교 배후의 메커니즘을 더욱 잘 이해할 수 있도록 분류 실험을 제공했다.", 'id': "Kami memeriksa tugas untuk mendeteksi perbandingan secara implicit yang keji (misalnya 'rambutmu terlihat seperti kamu telah dipotong listrik'). Perbandingan yang tidak masuk akal adalah perbandingan yang tidak masuk akal di mana kata-kata yang tidak masuk akal (misalnya 'bodoh' atau 'sampah'). We detail the process of creating a novel dataset for this task via crowdsourcing that includes several measures to obtain a sufficiently representative and unbiased set of comparisons.  Kami juga mempersembahkan eksperimen klasifikasi yang termasuk berbagai ciri-ciri bahasa yang membantu kita memahami lebih baik mekanisme dibanding perbandingan yang abusif.", 'af': "Ons ondersoek die opdrag om implicit abusive vergelykings te ontdek (bv. 'Jou hare lyk soos jy is elektriket'). Implisite abusive vergelykings is abusive vergelykings waarin abusive woorde (bv. 'dumbass' of 'scum') absent is. Ons detaljeer die proses van skep van 'n nuwe datastel vir hierdie taak deur verskeie vergelyking wat inkluit verskeie maatjies om 'n genoeg reprezentante en onbiasiese stel van vergelykings te kry. Ons het ook klasifikasie eksperimente voorgestel wat 'n reek lingwisiese funksies insluit wat ons beter help om die mekanisme wat ondersteun abusive vergelykings.", 'sw': "Tunajaribu jukumu la kutambua vipimo vya udhalilishaji usio na maana (kwa mfano 'nywele yako inaonekana kama umeme’). Mifano yasiyo na matumizi ni tofauti za matumizi ambazo maneno yanayodhalilisha (kwa mfano 'dumbass' au 'scum') hayakuwepo. Tunaelezea mchakato wa kutengeneza taarifa za riwaya kwa ajili ya kazi hii kupitia vyanzo vya habari vya umma ambavyo vinajumuisha hatua kadhaa za kupata mwakilishi wa kutosha na mfumo wa kutosha usio na upinzani. Pia tunaweka majaribio ya usambazaji yanayojumuisha vipengele vya lugha ambavyo vinatusaidia kuelewa vizuri mfumo unaofanana na matumizi yanayotumiwa.", 'am': "የግጭት ምሳሌዎችን ለማግኘት ስራውን እናፈትናለን (ምሳሌ ‹ጠጉርህ የኢሜይል መለኪያ ሆኖአል›) በተጨማሪም ምሳሌዎች አሰቃፊ ቃላት (ለምሳሌ 'dumbass' ወይም 'scum') አይቀርቡም፡፡ የዚህን አድራሻ የመረጃ ዳታዎችን መፍጠር፣ በሙሉ sources ማድረግ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ እና የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች አካሄዱን በማስተካከል የሚረዳንን የሥልጣናዎችን አስተያየት የሚችሉትን የክፍል ፈተናዎች እናደርጋለን፡፡", 'tr': "Biz da힊aryk salgyla힊yklary tapmaklygyny bar첵arys (mysal. 'Sa챌y흫yz elektrikler edilen 첵aly g 철r체n첵채r'). Etraf챌a hili h철wesli kar힊캇la힊tyrmalar bozgun챌 s철zleri (mesel창. 'dumbass' 첵a 'scum') 첵ok 힊eklinde 첵ok. Biz bu zady흫 체챌in ta첵첵arlan veri setirini k철p체rlemek 체챌in birn채챌e hereket etm채ge 첵eterlik we n채hili derejesini gola첵lamak 체챌in ta첵첵arlan챌ylygy 첵agda첵la첵arys. Biz hem 챌yky힊 derejesini 챌ykaryp 챌ykyp bilim 체첵tgewleri bolan 챌yky힊 derejesini gowy d체힊체nmek 체챌in k철mekle첵채n 챌yky힊 deneyleri g철rke첵채ris.", 'sq': "Ne e shqyrtojmë detyrën e zbulimit të krahasimeve implicit abuzive (për shembull, 'flokët tuaj duken sikur keni qenë elektrizuar'). Krahasimet implicitet abusive janë krahasimet abusive në të cilat nuk ekzistojnë fjalë abusive (për shembull 'budalla' apo 'plehra'). We detail the process of creating a novel dataset for this task via crowdsourcing that includes several measures to obtain a sufficiently representative and unbiased set of comparisons.  Ne prezantojmë gjithashtu eksperimente klasifikimi që përfshijnë një gamë karakteristike gjuhësore që na ndihmojnë të kuptojmë më mirë mekanizmat bazuar në krahasimet abuzive.", 'hy': "Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք այն խնդիրը, որ բացահայտում ենք ենթարկված չարաշահույթ համեմատություններ (օրինակ, «Ձեր մազերը կարծես էլեկտրակատված լինեն»): Implicitly abusive comparisons are abusive comparisons in which abusive words (e.g. 'dumbass' or 'scum') are absent.  Մենք մանրամասն ենք կազմում այս խնդրի համար նոր տվյալների համակարգի ստեղծման գործընթացը, որը ներառում է բազմաթիվ միջոցներ բավարար ներկայացուցիչ և անկողմնակի համեմատություններ ստանալու համար: We also present classification experiments that include a range of linguistic features that help us better understand the mechanisms underlying abusive comparisons.", 'bn': "আমরা প্রকৃতপক্ষে অত্যাচারী তুলনাগুলো আবিষ্কার করার কাজ পরীক্ষা করছি (উদাহরণস্বরূপ 'তোমার চুল দেখে মনে হচ্ছে তুমি বিদ্যুৎ Implicitly abusive comparisons are abusive comparisons in which abusive words (e.g. 'dumbass' or 'scum') are absent.  জনস্কোর্সিং এর মাধ্যমে আমরা এই কাজের জন্য একটি নোভেল ডাটাসেট তৈরি করার প্রক্রিয়া বিস্তারিত বর্ণনা করি যার মধ্যে যথেষ্ট প্রতিনিধি এবং অ আমরা এই পরীক্ষাও উপস্থাপন করছি যার মধ্যে ভাষার বিভিন্ন ভাষার বৈশিষ্ট্য রয়েছে যা আমাদের সাহায্য করে যে ব্যবস্থা নির্যাতনের তুলন", 'bs': 'Provjeravamo zadatak otkrivanja implicitno zlostavljajućih usporedba (na primjer. \'Vaša kosa izgleda kao da ste bili electrocuted\'). Implicitno zloupotrebne usporedbe su zloupotrebne usporedbe u kojima nema zloupotrebne riječi (npr. "gluposti" ili "smeće"). Mi detaljno objašnjavamo proces stvaranja novog set a podataka za ovaj zadatak putem crowdsourcing koji uključuje nekoliko mjera za dobivanje dovoljno reprezentativnog i nepristrasnog seta usporedba. Također predstavljamo klasifikacijske eksperimente koji uključuju niz jezičkih karakteristika koji nam pomažu bolje razumjeti mehanizme pod nasilnim usporedbama.', 'cs': 'Zkoumáme úkol detekovat implicitně zneužívající srovnání (např. "Vaše vlasy vypadají, jako byste byli poraženi elektrickým proudem"). Implicitně urážlivá srovnání jsou urážlivá srovnání, ve kterých chybí urážlivá slova (např. "blbec" nebo "špína"). Podrobně popisujeme proces vytváření nové datové sady pro tento úkol prostřednictvím crowdsourcingu, který obsahuje několik opatření pro získání dostatečně reprezentativního a nestranného souboru srovnání. Dále představujeme klasifikační experimenty, které obsahují řadu jazykových rysů, které nám pomáhají lépe porozumět mechanismům, které jsou základem zneužívání srovnání.', 'az': "Biz imkansız təcavüz salışlarını təşkil etmək məqsədini incidirik (məsələn 'saçlarınız elektriklə vurulmuş kimi g örünür'). Əslində həddi aşan salınmalar, həddi aşan sözlər (məsələn 'dumbass' və ya 'scum') yoxdur. Biz bu iş üçün yeni veri quruluşu yaratmaq prosesini çoxlu ölçü ilə təfsil edirik ki, çoxlu dəyişiklik və dəyişiklik müqayisədə qarşılaşdırmaq üçün çoxlu dəyişiklik var. Biz həmçinin klasifikasiya təcrübələrini də göstəririk ki, bizə həddi a şan məsələləri daha yaxşı anlamağa kömək edir.", 'et': 'Me uurime kaudselt kuritarvitavate võrdluste tuvastamise ülesannet (nt "Teie juuksed näevad välja nagu oleksid saanud elektrilöögi"). Kaudselt kuritarvitavad võrdlused on kuritarvitavad võrdlused, milles puuduvad kuritarvitavad sõnad (nt "loll" või "saast"). Üksikasjalikult kirjeldame selle ülesande jaoks uue andmekogumi loomist ühishankimise kaudu, mis sisaldab mitmeid meetmeid piisavalt representatiivse ja erapooletu võrdluskogumi saamiseks. Samuti tutvustame klassifitseerimiseksperimente, mis sisaldavad erinevaid keelelisi omadusi, mis aitavad meil paremini mõista kuritarvitavate võrdluste aluseks olevaid mehhanisme.', 'fi': 'Tutkimme epäsuorasti loukkaavien vertailujen havaitsemista (esim. "Hiuksesi näyttävät siltä, että sinut on sähköistetty"). Implisiittisesti väärinkäyttävät vertailut ovat väärinkäyttäviä vertailuja, joissa väärinkäyttäviä sanoja (esim. "typerys" tai "saasta") ei ole. Kerromme yksityiskohtaisesti prosessista luoda tätä tehtävää varten uusi aineisto joukkoistamalla, joka sisältää useita toimenpiteitä riittävän edustavan ja puolueettoman vertailukokonaisuuden saamiseksi. Esittelemme myös luokituskokeita, jotka sisältävät erilaisia kielellisiä ominaisuuksia, jotka auttavat meitä ymmärtämään paremmin väärinkäytösten taustalla olevia mekanismeja.', 'ca': 'Examinem la tasca de detectar comparacions implícitament abusives (per exemple, "El teu cabell sembla que has estat electrocutat"). Implicitly abusive comparisons are abusive comparisons in which abusive words (e.g. \'dumbass\' or \'scum\') are absent.  We detail the process of creating a novel dataset for this task via crowdsourcing that includes several measures to obtain a sufficiently representative and unbiased set of comparisons.  We also present classification experiments that include a range of linguistic features that help us better understand the mechanisms underlying abusive comparisons.', 'ha': 'Munã jarraba aikin ka gane misãlai masu abuni da bã mai so ba (misali, "nywelunka na kama ka salo." An buga misãlai masu zartar da su kamar misãlai mãsu zargi ne da wasu kalmõmi da za\'a karɓi (misali\'dumbass\' ko \'kifi\'). Munã rarrabe aikin da za\'a halitta wani danne na nowaya wa wannan aikin da za\'a iya amfani da umarni source wanda ke ƙunsa da wasu takwara dõmin ka sami wani matsayi mai isa ga wakili da wanda ba\'a sãɓa ba. Kayya, Munã halatar da jarrabai masu fasalin da ke cikin wasu masu cikin harshen, waɗanda ke taimakon mu da mafi alhẽri ga fahimta matsayin misalin da ke ƙaranci.', 'jv': 'Awakdhéwé éntukno karo perusahaan neng akeh onhal-perusahaan (isum. \'bal-akham barang kelamèh durung kelamèh\'). politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Awak dhéwé nggawe perusahaan kelompok nggawe dataset kanggo nggawe task iki dadi, nik sekolahan kanggo nyenggawe barang sliwat kanggo ngerawak dhéwé Where\'s the last representation Awak dhéwé éntuk karo perbudhakan winih kanggo nyelaran karo akeh operasi ingkang luwih dumadhi kéné luwih apik nyelarane', 'sk': 'Preučujemo nalogo odkrivanja implicitno zlorabljajočih primerjav (npr. "Vaši lasje izgledajo, kot da ste bili ubiti z elektriko"). Implicitno zlorabljajoče primerjave so zlorabljajoče primerjave, pri katerih ni zlorabljajočih besed (npr. "bedak" ali "izmeček"). Podrobno opisujemo proces ustvarjanja novega nabora podatkov za to nalogo prek množičnega sourcinga, ki vključuje več ukrepov za pridobitev dovolj reprezentativnega in nepristranskega nabora primerjav. Predstavljamo tudi eksperimente klasifikacije, ki vključujejo vrsto jezikovnih značilnosti, ki nam pomagajo bolje razumeti mehanizme, na katerih temeljijo zlorabe primerjave.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་གསལ་བ་ཁག་ཅིག་གནད་སྡུད་མེད་པའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་རྙེད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་ལ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནི་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཚོར་བརྟན་བཀལ་བའི་སྒྲིག་ཚིག་དག་ཕྱི་ཁག་པ་ཡིན། We detail the process of creating a novel dataset for this task via crowdsourcing that includes several measures to obtain a sufficiently representative and unbiased set of comparisons. ང་ཚོས་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཅིག་ཡོད་པའི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱང་མཐོང་བྱེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཚོར་ཕལ་ཆེན་ཐབས་', 'he': "We examine the task of detecting implicitly abusive comparisons (e.g. 'Your hair looks like you have been electrocuted').  Implicitly abusive comparisons are abusive comparisons in which abusive words (e.g. 'dumbass' or 'scum') are absent.  אנו מפרטים את התהליך של יצירת קבוצת נתונים חדשה למשימה הזאת דרך crowdsourcing שכלול מספר אמצעים כדי להשיג קבוצת משוואות מייצגת מספיק ולא מוצדדית. We also present classification experiments that include a range of linguistic features that help us better understand the mechanisms underlying abusive comparisons."}
{'en': 'A Systematic Review of Reproducibility Research in Natural Language Processing', 'es': 'Una revisión sistemática de la investigación de reproducibilidad en el procesamiento del lenguaje natural', 'pt': 'Uma Revisão Sistemática da Pesquisa de Reprodutibilidade em Processamento de Linguagem Natural', 'ar': 'مراجعة منهجية لأبحاث التكاثر في معالجة اللغة الطبيعية', 'fr': 'Une revue systématique de la recherche sur la reproductibilité dans le traitement du langage naturel', 'zh': '自然语言治中再现性研究之统综述', 'ja': '自然言語処理における再現性研究の体系的なレビュー', 'ru': 'Систематический обзор исследования воспроизводимости в обработке естественного языка', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण में पुनरुत्पादन अनुसंधान की एक व्यवस्थित समीक्षा', 'ga': 'Athbhreithniú Córasach ar Thaighde atáirgthe i bPróiseáil Teanga Nádúrtha', 'hu': 'A reprodukciós kutatás rendszeres áttekintése a természetes nyelv feldolgozásában', 'el': 'Μια συστηματική επισκόπηση της έρευνας αναπαραγωγής στην επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας', 'ka': 'სისტემატიური განახლება რეპოდისუციალური სახელის პროცესი', 'it': "Revisione sistematica della ricerca sulla riproducibilità nell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale", 'kk': 'Түзіндік тіл процессерінде репродукциялық зерттеулердің систематикалық қарау', 'mk': 'Систематски преглед на истражувањата за репродуктибилност во процесот на природен јазик', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Reviżjoni Sistematika tar-Riċerka dwar ir-Riproduttività fl-Ipproċessar tal-Lingwi Naturali', 'lt': 'Sisteminė reprodukcijos mokslinių tyrimų gamtinės kalbos apdorojimo srityje apžvalga', 'ml': 'A Systematic Review of Reproducibility Research in Natural Language Processing', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн систематикийн шинжлэх ухаан', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Systematyczny przegląd badań nad reprodukcyjnością w przetwarzaniu języka naturalnego', 'so': 'A Systematic Review of Reproductibility Research in Natural Language Processing', 'sr': 'Sistemski pregled istraživanja reproduktivnosti u procesu prirodnog jezika', 'ro': 'O revizuire sistematică a cercetării de reproductibilitate în procesarea limbajului natural', 'sv': 'En systematisk genomgång av reproduktionsforskning inom naturspråksbehandling', 'ur': 'طبیعی زبان پرسس میں ایک سیستماتیک ردیابی کی روشنی', 'ta': 'Name', 'si': 'ස්වභාවික භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණයේ පරීක්ෂණාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Nghiên cứu về khả năng tái phát ngôn ngữ tự nhiên', 'da': 'En systematisk gennemgang af reproducerbarhedsforskning i natursprogbehandling', 'hr': 'Sistemski pregled istraživanja reproduktivnosti prirodnog jezika', 'id': 'Sebuah Review Sistematik Penelitian Penembakan Dalam Proses Bahasa Alam', 'ko': '자연 언어 처리에서의 재현적 연구의 체계적 종합 서술', 'nl': 'Een systematische evaluatie van reproduceerbaarheidsonderzoek in de verwerking van natuurlijke taal', 'de': 'Eine systematische Überprüfung der Reproduzierbarkeitsforschung in der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache', 'bg': 'Систематичен преглед на изследванията за възпроизводимост в обработката на естествения език', 'tr': 'Dobiýal dil işleýişinde ýalňyşlyk barlagynyň sistematik barlamasyny', 'fa': 'یک تحقیقات سیستماتیک تحقیقات تغییرگیری در پرداخت زبان طبیعی', 'sw': 'A Systematic Review of Reproducibility Research in Natural Language Processing', 'af': "'n Sistemiese Hersiening van Herstellingsversoek in Natuurlike Taal Prosessering", 'am': 'A Systematic Review of Reproducibility Research in Natural Language Processing', 'sq': 'Një përmbledhje sistematike e kërkimit të riprodhueshmërisë në procesimin e gjuhës natyrore', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়ায় প্রতিনিধিত্ব গবেষণার একটি সিস্টেমিক রিভিউ', 'az': 'Təbiətli Dil İşləməsində yenilənmək Araştırmasının sistematik tərzi', 'hy': 'Բնական լեզվի մշակույթի հետազոտությունների համակարգչային վերլուծությունը', 'ca': 'Una revisió sistemàtica de la recerca de reproducibilitat en el processament de llenguatges naturals', 'bs': 'Sistemski pregled istraživanja reproduktivnosti u procesu prirodnog jezika', 'cs': 'Systematický přehled výzkumu reprodukovatelnosti ve zpracování přirozeného jazyka', 'et': 'Looduskeele töötlemise reprodutseeritavuse uuringute süstemaatiline ülevaade', 'fi': 'Systematic Review of Reprodutibility Research in Natural Language Processing', 'jv': 'Rasané sistematik Rasané révoluksi kanggo ngilangno langgambar Daerah', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་རྒྱས་ཁབ་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཚོད་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ་དེ་ནི་', 'sk': 'Sistematični pregled raziskav reproduktibilnosti v obdelavi naravnega jezika', 'he': 'מערכת מערכת של מחקר ניתוח בתהליך שפות טבעית'}
{'en': 'Against the background of what has been termed a reproducibility crisis in science, the NLP field is becoming increasingly interested in, and conscientious about, the reproducibility of its results. The past few years have seen an impressive range of new initiatives, events and active research in the area. However, the field is far from reaching a consensus about how reproducibility should be defined, measured and addressed, with diversity of views currently increasing rather than converging. With this focused contribution, we aim to provide a wide-angle, and as near as possible complete, snapshot of current work on reproducibility in NLP,', 'ar': 'على خلفية ما تم تسميته بأزمة التكاثر في العلوم ، أصبح مجال البرمجة اللغوية العصبية أكثر اهتمامًا وإدراكًا لاستنساخ نتائجه. شهدت السنوات القليلة الماضية مجموعة رائعة من المبادرات والفعاليات الجديدة والبحوث النشطة في المنطقة. ومع ذلك ، فإن المجال بعيد كل البعد عن التوصل إلى توافق في الآراء حول كيفية تحديد إمكانية التكاثر وقياسها ومعالجتها ، مع تنوع وجهات النظر المتزايدة حاليًا بدلاً من التقارب. من خلال هذه المساهمة المركزة ، نهدف إلى توفير لقطة واسعة الزاوية ، وأقرب ما يمكن ، من العمل الحالي على التكاثر في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية ،', 'fr': "Dans le contexte de ce que l'on a appelé une crise de reproductibilité en science, le domaine de la PNL s'intéresse de plus en plus à la reproductibilité de ses résultats et s'intéresse de plus en plus à la reproductibilité de ses résultats. Ces dernières années ont vu une gamme impressionnante de nouvelles initiatives, d'événements et de recherches actives dans le domaine. Cependant, le domaine est loin de parvenir à un consensus sur la manière dont la reproductibilité doit être définie, mesurée et traitée, la diversité des points de vue augmentant au lieu de converger. Avec cette contribution ciblée, nous visons à fournir un aperçu grand angle et aussi complet que possible des travaux actuels sur la reproductibilité en PNL,", 'es': 'En el contexto de lo que se ha denominado una crisis de reproducibilidad en la ciencia, el campo de la PNL se está interesando cada vez más en la reproducibilidad de sus resultados y es cada vez más consciente de la reproducibilidad de sus resultados. En los últimos años se ha visto una impresionante gama de nuevas iniciativas, eventos e investigación activa en el área. Sin embargo, el campo está lejos de alcanzar un consenso sobre cómo debe definirse, medirse y abordarse la reproducibilidad, con una diversidad de puntos de vista que actualmente aumenta en lugar de converger. Con esta contribución específica, nuestro objetivo es proporcionar una instantánea de gran angular y lo más completa posible del trabajo actual sobre reproducibilidad en PNL,', 'pt': 'No contexto do que foi chamado de crise de reprodutibilidade na ciência, o campo da PNL está se tornando cada vez mais interessado e consciente sobre a reprodutibilidade de seus resultados. Os últimos anos testemunharam uma gama impressionante de novas iniciativas, eventos e pesquisas ativas na área. No entanto, o campo está longe de chegar a um consenso sobre como a reprodutibilidade deve ser definida, medida e abordada, com a diversidade de visões atualmente aumentando em vez de convergir. Com esta contribuição focada, pretendemos fornecer uma visão ampla e o mais completa possível do trabalho atual sobre reprodutibilidade em PNL,', 'hi': 'विज्ञान में पुनरुत्पादन संकट की पृष्ठभूमि के खिलाफ, एनएलपी क्षेत्र तेजी से रुचि रखता जा रहा है, और इसके परिणामों की पुनरुत्पादकता के बारे में ईमानदार हो रहा है। पिछले कुछ वर्षों में इस क्षेत्र में नई पहलों, घटनाओं और सक्रिय अनुसंधान की एक प्रभावशाली श्रृंखला देखी गई है। हालांकि, क्षेत्र इस बारे में आम सहमति तक पहुंचने से बहुत दूर है कि पुनरुत्पादन को कैसे परिभाषित किया जाना चाहिए, मापा जाना चाहिए और संबोधित किया जाना चाहिए, वर्तमान में अभिसरण के बजाय विचारों की विविधता बढ़ रही है। इस केंद्रित योगदान के साथ, हम एक व्यापक कोण प्रदान करने का लक्ष्य रखते हैं, और जितना संभव हो सके पूरा हो सके, एनएलपी में पुनरुत्पादन पर वर्तमान काम का स्नैपशॉट,', 'ja': '科学における再現性の危機と呼ばれてきた背景には、NLP分野がその結果の再現性にますます関心を持ち、良心的になってきていることがある。過去数年間、この分野では様々な新しい取り組み、イベント、積極的な研究が行われてきました。しかし、この分野は、再現性の定義、測定、対処方法についてのコンセンサスには程遠く、多様な見解が収束するのではなく、現在増加している。この集中的な貢献により、NLPでの再現性に関する現在の作業の広角かつ可能な限り完全なスナップショットを提供することを目指しています。', 'zh': '所谓科学可重复性危背景者,NLP域之可重复性益精也。 在昔数年,其地有深新举措深究。 然当领远未定义、量决可重复性成共识,目前之论多样性方增,非趋同也。 献之于此,吾所以供一广角,尽可近全者,NLP复现性之快照也。', 'ru': 'На фоне того, что было названо кризисом воспроизводимости в науке, область NLP становится все более заинтересованной и сознательной в воспроизводимости своих результатов. За последние несколько лет мы стали свидетелями впечатляющего числа новых инициатив, мероприятий и активных исследований в этой области. Однако в этой области еще далеко не достигнут консенсус в отношении того, как следует определять, измерять и решать вопрос о воспроизводимости, при этом разнообразие мнений в настоящее время не сходится, а увеличивается. С этим сфокусированным вкладом, мы стремимся обеспечить широкий ракурс, и как можно ближе, полный, снимок текущей работы по воспроизводимости в NLP,', 'ga': 'I gcomhthéacs a bhfuil ar a dtugtar géarchéim in-atáirgtheachta san eolaíocht, tá níos mó suime ag baint le réimse an NLP in in-atáirgtheacht na dtorthaí agus tá siad coinsiasach faoi. Le blianta beaga anuas tá raon suntasach tionscnamh nua, imeachtaí agus taighde gníomhach sa réimse seo. Mar sin féin, tá an réimse i bhfad ó bheith ag teacht ar chomhdhearcadh maidir le conas is ceart in-atáirgtheacht a shainiú, a thomhas agus aghaidh a thabhairt uirthi, agus éagsúlacht tuairimí ag méadú faoi láthair seachas ag teacht le chéile. Leis an rannchuidiú dírithe seo, tá sé mar aidhm againn léargas leathan, agus chomh críochnúil agus is féidir, a sholáthar den obair reatha ar in-atáirgtheacht in NLP,', 'ka': 'რომელიც მეცნიერებაში გამოცდილობა კრიზატის მიხედვით, NLP პირველი უფრო მეტი დაინტერესებულია და ცნობიერებულია მისი შედეგების გამოცდილობა. ბოლო რამდენიმე წლის შემდეგ ახალი ინტერიციატიები, მოვლენები და აკეთესი განსხვავებები ამ ადგილში ხედავთ. მაგრამ, სახლის განსხვავება განსხვავებულია, როგორ განსხვავებული განსხვავებულობა უნდა განსხვავებული, განსხვავებულია და მისამართებულია, როგორც განსხვავებულობა ახლა უფრო მეტი გა ამ ფონსკურებული დამატებით, ჩვენ მინდა გავაკეთოთ დიდი კუთხი, და რომლებიც შესაძლებელია დასრულებული, მიმდინარე სამუშაო განმხლებელობის შესახებ,', 'it': "Sullo sfondo di quella che è stata definita una crisi di riproducibilità nella scienza, il campo NLP sta diventando sempre più interessato e coscienzioso circa la riproducibilità dei suoi risultati. Negli ultimi anni si è assistito a una serie impressionante di nuove iniziative, eventi e ricerche attive sul territorio. Tuttavia, il campo è ben lungi dal raggiungere un consenso su come definire, misurare e affrontare la riproducibilità, con la diversità delle opinioni attualmente in aumento piuttosto che convergere. Con questo contributo mirato, miriamo a fornire un'istantanea grandangolare, e il più vicino possibile completa, del lavoro corrente sulla riproducibilità in PNL,", 'kk': 'Бірақ ғылымдың репродукциялық қиындығы деп аталатын нәрсенің аясына қарсы, NLP өрісі өте көп қызықты болып, оның нәтижесінің репродукциялығын білмейді. Соңғы бірнеше жыл бұл аумақтағы жаңа инициативалар, оқиғалар мен белсенді зерттеу аралығын көрді. Бірақ өріс қалай қайталану, өлшемі және адресті анықтауға қажет болатын, қазіргі көптеген көріністер көптеген, қазіргі көптеген. Бұл көңіл көмектесетін көңіл бұрышты, NLP-де қайталану үшін қазіргі жұмыс сүргізіміздің жақындағы көңіл бұрышты көрсетуге мақсатымыз.', 'el': 'Στο πλαίσιο αυτού που αποκαλείται κρίση αναπαραγωγής στην επιστήμη, ο τομέας του ΝΛΠ ενδιαφέρεται όλο και περισσότερο για την αναπαραγωγιμότητα των αποτελεσμάτων του. Τα τελευταία χρόνια έχουν δει ένα εντυπωσιακό φάσμα νέων πρωτοβουλιών, εκδηλώσεων και ενεργών ερευνών στην περιοχή. Ωστόσο, ο τομέας απέχει πολύ από την επίτευξη συναίνεσης σχετικά με το πώς θα πρέπει να οριστεί, να μετρηθεί και να αντιμετωπιστεί η αναπαραγωγιμότητα, με την πολυμορφία των απόψεων να αυξάνεται επί του παρόντος αντί να συγκλίνει. Με αυτή την επικεντρωμένη συνεισφορά, στόχος μας είναι να παρέχουμε ένα ευρυγώνιο, και όσο το δυνατόν πλησιέστερο πλήρες στιγμιότυπο της τρέχουσας εργασίας για την αναπαραγωγιμότητα στο ΝΛΠ,', 'hu': 'A tudomány reprodukálhatósági válságának nevezett hátterében az NLP területét egyre inkább érdeklődik, és lelkiismeretesebbé válik az eredmények reprodukálhatósága iránt. Az elmúlt néhány évben rengeteg új kezdeményezés, esemény és aktív kutatás zajlott a területen. A terület azonban messze van attól, hogy konszenzusra jusson a reprodukálhatóság meghatározásáról, méréséről és kezeléséről, mivel a nézetek sokfélesége jelenleg inkább növekszik, mint konvergenciák. Ezzel a koncentrált hozzájárulással arra törekszünk, hogy széles látószögű és a lehető legközelebbi teljes pillanatfelvételt nyújtsunk a reprodukálhatósággal kapcsolatos aktuális munkáról NLP-ben,', 'lt': 'Atsižvelgiant į tai, kas vadinama mokslo atkuriamumo krize, NLP sritis vis labiau domisi savo rezultatų atkuriamumu ir supranta apie jį. Per pastaruosius kelerius metus šioje srityje buvo įspūdingos naujos iniciatyvos, renginiai ir aktyvūs moksliniai tyrimai. However, the field is far from reaching a consensus about how reproducibility should be defined, measured and addressed, with diversity of views currently increasing rather than converging.  Šiuo tiksliniu indėliu siekiame suteikti plataus kampo ir kuo greičiau užbaigtą dabartinio NLP atkuriamumo darbo apžvalgą,', 'mk': 'Со оглед на она што се нарекува репродуктибилити криза во науката, полето НЛП станува сé повеќе заинтересирано и свесно за репродуктибилитетот на своите резултати. Во изминатите неколку години се видени импресивни нови иницијативи, настани и активно истражување во областа. Сепак, полето е далеку од постигнување консензус за тоа како репродуктибилитетот треба да се дефинира, мери и решава, со различност на погледи која моментно се зголемува наместо да се конверзира. Со овој фокусиран придонес, ние имаме за цел да обезбедиме широк агол и што е можно поблиску до комплетна слика на тековната работа на репродуктибилитетот во НЛП,', 'mn': 'Шинжлэх ухааны үржигдэх хямрал гэж нэрлэгдсэн зүйлсийн талаар NLP салбар ихэвчлэн сонирхолтой болж, үржигдэхэд ухамсартай болж байна. Өнгөрсөн хэдэн жилийн турш энэ хэсэгт шинэ инициатив, үйл явдал, актив судалгааг харсан. Гэвч энэ салбар хэрхэн үржүүлэх, хэмжээлтэй, хайлтын тухай ойлголт хэрхэн нэмэгддэг вэ гэдгийг ойлгохгүй байна. Энэ төвлөрсөн түвшинд бид нийтлэг өнцөг хангамж өгөх зорилго, NLP дахин үржих боломжтой үйлдлийн хамгийн ойрхон нь', 'no': 'Etter bakgrunnen av det som er kalla eit reproduktivitetkrise i vitenskap, blir NLP-feltet større interessert i og bevisst om reproduktiviteten av resultatene. Dei siste få år har sett eit uttrykkelig område av nye initiativer, hendingar og aktive forskning i området. Dette feltet er likevel langt frå å nå ein konsensus om korleis reproduktiviteten skal definerast, målt og adressert, med mange visingar som nå aukar i staden for å sambande. Med denne fokuserte bidraga må vi gjere eit breidde vinkel, og så nær som mulig fullført skjermbilete av gjeldande arbeid på reproduktivitet i NLP,', 'ml': 'ശാസ്ത്രത്തിലെ പ്രവർത്തിക്കാവുന്ന പ്രശ്നത്തിന്റെ പിന്നാൽ, NLP ഫീല്\u200dഡ് അതിന്റെ ഫലത്തിന്റെ പ്രവർത്തകതയെക്കുറിച്ചും വളരെ താല്പര്യമുള്ളത കഴിഞ്ഞ കുറച്ചു വര്\u200dഷങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ പ്രദേശത്തുള്ള പുതിയ പ്രായോഗ്യങ്ങള്\u200d, സംഭവങ്ങളും സജ്ജീവമായ പരിശോധന നടത്തുന്നതും കണ എന്നാലും നിലത്തിന്റെ ഒരു സമ്മതം എത്തുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്ന് അകലെയുണ്ട്, പ്രായശ്ചിത്വം എങ്ങനെയാണ് നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കേണ്ടതെന്നും അളന്നും വിശദീ ഈ ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചുകൊണ്ട് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു വിശാലമായ കോണ്\u200dഡ് നല്\u200dകാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു, പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായിരിക്കുന്നത് പോലെ നിലവിലുള്ള ജോ', 'ms': 'Dalam latar belakang apa yang telah disebut krisis kemudahan ulang dalam sains, medan NLP semakin tertarik pada, dan sedar tentang, kemudahan ulang hasilnya. Beberapa tahun terakhir telah melihat julat yang mengesankan inisiatif baru, peristiwa dan kajian aktif di kawasan ini. Namun, medan ini jauh dari mencapai konsensus mengenai bagaimana pemulihan patut ditakrif, diukur dan ditujukan, dengan pelbagai pandangan semasa meningkat daripada berkumpul. Dengan kontribusi fokus ini, kami bertujuan untuk menyediakan sudut luas, dan sesekali yang mungkin selesai, snapshot kerja semasa pada reproducibility dalam NLP,', 'pl': 'W kontekście kryzysu powtarzalności w nauce, dziedzina NLP staje się coraz bardziej zainteresowana powtarzalnością swoich wyników i jest bardziej sumienna. W ciągu ostatnich kilku lat odnotowano imponującą gamę nowych inicjatyw, wydarzeń i aktywnych badań w tej dziedzinie. Jednakże dziedzina ta jest daleka od osiągnięcia konsensusu co do tego, w jaki sposób powtarzalność powinna być definiowana, mierzona i uwzględniana, a różnorodność poglądów obecnie rośnie raczej niż zbiegająca się. Dzięki temu ukierunkowanemu wkładowi staramy się zapewnić szerokokątny i jak najbliższy kompletny migawek bieżących prac nad powtarzalnością w NLP,', 'sr': 'Prema pozadini onoga što je nazvano krizom reproduktivnosti u nauci, polje NLP postaje sve više zainteresovano i svestan za reproduktivnost rezultata. Zadnjih nekoliko godina su videli impresivni niz novih inicijativa, događaja i aktivnih istraživanja u tom području. Međutim, polje je daleko od postizanja konsenzusa o tome kako treba definisati, mjeriti i rešiti reproduktivnost, s raznolikošću pogleda koji trenutno raste, a ne konverzivanja. Sa ovom usredotočenom doprinošću, mi ciljamo pružiti širok kut, i što je bliže moguće potpuni snimak trenutnog rada o reproduktivnosti u NLP-u,', 'ro': 'Pe fondul a ceea ce a fost numită o criză de reproductibilitate în știință, domeniul PNL devine din ce în ce mai interesat și conștiincios despre reproductibilitatea rezultatelor sale. În ultimii ani au fost observate o gamă impresionantă de inițiative, evenimente și cercetări active în domeniu. Cu toate acestea, domeniul este departe de a ajunge la un consens cu privire la modul în care ar trebui definită, măsurată și abordată reproductibilitatea, diversitatea opiniilor fiind în prezent în creștere, mai degrabă decât convergentă. Cu această contribuție concentrată, ne propunem să oferim un instantaneu cu unghi larg și cât mai aproape posibil complet al lucrărilor curente privind reproductibilitatea în PNL,', 'mt': "Fl-isfond ta’ dak li ġie msejjaħ kriżi ta’ riproduċibbiltà fix-xjenza, il-qasam tal-NLP qed isir dejjem aktar interessat fir-riproduċibbiltà tar-riżultati tiegħu u qed isir konxju dwaru. L-aħħar ftit snin raw firxa impressjonanti ta’ inizjattivi, avvenimenti u riċerka attiva ġodda fil-qasam. Madankollu, il-qasam għadu 'l bogħod milli jilħaq kunsens dwar kif għandha tiġi definita, imkejla u indirizzata r-riproduċibbiltà, b'diversità ta' fehmiet li bħalissa qed tiżdied aktar milli qed tikkonverġixxi. B’din il-kontribuzzjoni ffukata, għandna l-għan li nipprovdu stampa wiesgħa, u kemm jista’ jkun kważi kompluta, tal-ħidma attwali dwar ir-riproduċibbiltà fil-NLP,", 'ta': 'அறிவியலில் பின்னணி பிரச்சனையின் பின்னணியில், NLP புலம் அதிகமாக ஆர்வமாகிக்கிறது மற்றும் அதன் விளைவுகளின் பெரும்பாட்டிற்கு தெரியும். கடந்த சில வருடங்களில் புதிய துவக்கங்கள், நிகழ்வுகள் மற்றும் செயல்படும் ஆய்வுகளை பார்த்துள்ளார்கள். ஆயினும், புலம் எப்படி பிரித்தல் வேண்டும் என்பதை அறுதி, அளவு மற்றும் முகவரிக்க வேண்டும் என்பதை பற்றி ஒரு ஒப்புக்கொள்வது தொலைவில் தொலைவி இந்த முக்கியமான செயல்பாடுகளுடன், நாம் ஒரு நீளமான கோணத்தை வழங்க வேண்டும் மற்றும் முடிந்தது முழுமையாக இருக்கும் நிலையில் N', 'ur': 'اس کے پیچھے سے جو سائنس میں ایک دوبارہ پیدا کرنے والی مصیبت کا نام لیا گیا ہے، NLP کھیتی اس سے زیادہ علاقہ پیدا ہوتی ہے، اور اس کے نتیجے کی دوبارہ پیدا کرنے والی ہے. گزشتہ چند سال نے اس منطقه میں نئی شرکتوں، حادثوں اور فعالی تحقیق کے ایک اثر انگیز طریقہ دیکھا ہے. لیکن کھیتی ایک کنسوس تک پہنچ جانے سے دور ہے کہ کس طرح پیدا ہونے کی تعریف، اندازے اور سمجھنے کی ضرورت ہے، اور اکثر مختلف نظروں سے زیادہ اضافہ ہونے کی جاتی ہے۔ اس کا منتخب کیا گیا ہے، ہم نے ایک گھیرے زاویہ کا ارادہ کیا ہے، اور جس قدر ممکن ہے کامل، NLP میں دوبارہ پیدا ہونے کے بارے میں موجود عمل کا اسنپشٹ،', 'si': 'විද්\u200dයානයේ ප්\u200dරතිපද්ධතියක් කියලා කියලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිපද්ධතියක් විදිහට, NLP ප්\u200dරතිපද්ධතිය විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂය වෙනවා,  අන්තිම අවුරුදු කිහිපයක් අලුත් ආරම්භයක්, අවස්ථාව සහ සක්\u200dරිය පරීක්ෂණයක් දැක්කා. නමුත්, ක්\u200dෂේත්\u200dරය තමයි ප්\u200dරතිපත්තිය කොහොමද විශේෂය, මාපනය සහ ප්\u200dරතිපත්ති කරන්න ඕනේ කියලා සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිපත මේ ප්\u200dරධානය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, අපි අදහස් කරනවා ලොකු කෝණයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න, සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම පු', 'so': 'Tan iyo dib u soo jeeda dhibaatada qofka cilmiga ka soo celinta, beerta NLP waxey u sii xiisaysan tahay mid aad u xiisaysan iyo caqli ah oo ku saabsan qofka soo celinta. Sannadihii ugu danbeeyey waxay arkeen waxqabadyo cusub, dhacdooyin iyo waxbarasho waxqabad ah ee agagaarka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee duurku waa ka fog yahay inuu heshiis gaadho sida loo qoro, qiyaaso, lana hadlo, aragyo kala duduwan oo aan la beddelin. Markaas waxan ku hagaajinnaa, waxaynu ku talo galaynaa in aad ka buuxiso meel ballaadhan, oo ugu dhaw sida suurtagal ah, sawirka shaqada la soo jeedo oo ku saabsan qofka la soo celinayo NLP,', 'sv': 'Mot bakgrund av vad som har kallats en reproducerbarhetskris inom vetenskapen blir NLP-området alltmer intresserad och samvetsgrannt kring reproducerbarheten av dess resultat. Under de senaste åren har ett imponerande utbud av nya initiativ, evenemang och aktiv forskning inom området. Området är dock långt ifrån att nå enighet om hur reproducerbarhet bör definieras, mätas och hanteras, och mångfalden av åsikter ökar för närvarande snarare än konvergeras. Med detta fokuserade bidrag strävar vi efter att ge en vidvinkel, och så nära som möjligt fullständig, ögonblicksbild av pågående arbete med reproducerbarhet i NLP,', 'uz': "Ilmiy sohasida taqdimlik muvaffaqiyatlarining orqa foni bilan, NLP maydoni juda qiziqarli bo'ladi va natijalarining taqdimligini anglatadi. Keyingi necha yil davlatda yangi tashkilotlar, hodisalar va aktiv tajribalarni ko'rdi. Lekin, maydon qanday qo'llanmalarni aniqlash, qiyalashtirish va raqamlash kerak bo'lgan bir xil koʻrinishida ko'p ko'payishi mumkin. Bu fokuslangan paydo bilan, biz juda ko'p burchakni qo'shish uchun, va hozirgi narsa NLP davomida qo'llanmalar", 'vi': 'Dựa trên cái gọi là cuộc khủng hoảng sinh sản trong khoa học, trường New LP ngày càng chú ý đến khả năng tái sinh của nó. Trong những năm qua, đã có một loạt những khởi đầu, sự kiện và nghiên cứu tích cực trong khu vực. Tuy nhiên, lĩnh vực này còn chưa đạt được sự đồng ý về cách xác định, đo đạc và đối mặt khả năng sinh sản nên được xác định, với sự khác biệt quan điểm hiện tại đang tăng lên thay vì hội tụ. Với sự đóng góp tập trung này, chúng tôi dự định cung cấp một góc rộng, và càng gần hoàn chỉnh, hình ảnh chụp những tác phẩm hiện thời về tái sinh tại Njala,', 'bg': 'На фона на това, което се нарича криза на възпроизводимостта в науката, областта на НЛП става все по-заинтересована и съвестна за възпроизводимостта на резултатите. През последните няколко години се наблюдава впечатляващ набор от нови инициативи, събития и активни изследвания в областта. Обаче тази област далеч не достига консенсус относно това как следва да се определи, измери и разгледа възпроизводимостта, като разнообразието от гледни точки понастоящем се увеличава, а не се сближава. С този фокусиран принос, ние се стремим да предоставим широкоъгълна и възможно най-близо пълна снимка на текущата работа по възпроизводимостта в НЛП,', 'da': 'På baggrund af den såkaldte reproducerbarhedskrise inden for videnskaben bliver NLP-området stadig mere interesseret i og samvittighedsfuldt omkring reproducerbarheden af resultaterne. De seneste år har der været en imponerende række nye initiativer, arrangementer og aktiv forskning på området. Området er imidlertid langt fra nået til enighed om, hvordan reproducerbarheden skal defineres, måles og behandles, idet mangfoldigheden af synspunkter i øjeblikket stiger snarere end konvergerer. Med dette fokuserede bidrag tilstræber vi at levere et vidvinkelbillede, og så nær som muligt komplet, snapshot af aktuelle arbejder med reproducerbarhed i NLP,', 'hr': 'S obzirom na pozadinu onoga što se naziva kriza reproduktivnosti u znanosti, polje NLP postaje sve više zainteresovano i svjesno o reproduktivnosti rezultata. Zadnjih nekoliko godina vidjeli su impresivni niz novih inicijativa, događaja i aktivnih istraživanja u tom području. Međutim, polje je daleko od postizanja konsenzusa o tome kako treba definirati, mjeriti i riješiti reproduktivnost, s raznolikošću pogleda koji trenutno raste umjesto konverzivanja. Uz taj usredotočeni doprinos, mi ciljamo pružiti širok kut, i što je bliže moguće potpuni snimak trenutnog rada o reproduktivnosti u NLP-u,', 'nl': 'Tegen de achtergrond van wat in de wetenschap een reproduceerbaarheidscrisis wordt genoemd, wordt het NLP-veld steeds meer geïnteresseerd in en bewust van de reproduceerbaarheid van de resultaten. De afgelopen jaren is er een indrukwekkend scala aan nieuwe initiatieven, evenementen en actief onderzoek op het gebied geweest. Het veld is echter verre van tot een consensus over de wijze waarop reproduceerbaarheid moet worden gedefinieerd, gemeten en aangepakt, waarbij de diversiteit van standpunten momenteel toeneemt in plaats van convergereert. Met deze gerichte bijdrage willen we een groothoek, en zo dicht mogelijk volledige snapshot geven van het huidige werk aan reproduceerbaarheid in NLP,', 'de': 'Vor dem Hintergrund einer so genannten Reproduzierbarkeitskrise in der Wissenschaft interessiert sich das NLP-Feld zunehmend für die Reproduzierbarkeit seiner Ergebnisse. In den letzten Jahren gab es eine beeindruckende Palette neuer Initiativen, Veranstaltungen und aktiver Forschung in diesem Bereich. Allerdings ist das Feld weit davon entfernt, einen Konsens darüber zu erreichen, wie Reproduzierbarkeit definiert, gemessen und angegangen werden sollte, wobei die Vielfalt der Ansichten derzeit eher zunimmt als konvergiert. Mit diesem fokussierten Beitrag wollen wir eine weitwinkelige und möglichst vollständige Momentaufnahme aktueller Arbeiten zur Reproduzierbarkeit in NLP liefern.', 'fa': 'بر خلاف زمینه\u200cی چیزی که به عنوان بحران بازآفرینی در علم نامیده شده است، زمینه NLP بیشتر به آن علاقه\u200cمند می\u200cشود و آگاه می\u200cشود، بازآفرینی نتیجه\u200cاش. چند سال گذشته یک مجموعه تحقیقات تاثیر انگیز جدید، اتفاقات و تحقیقات فعالی در این منطقه را دیده اند. ولی این زمینه از رسیدن به یک کنسونس درباره اینکه چگونه بازگشت باید تعریف شود، اندازه گیری شود و دریافت شود، با مختلف دیدگان در حال حاضر به جای جمع شدن افزایش می کنند. با این شرکت تمرکز، هدف می\u200cگیریم که یک زاویه گسترده را تهیه کنیم، و به حد نزدیک تر کامل، تصاویر کارهای فعلی روی بازگشت در NLP،', 'tr': "Ilmi ýagdaýda ýetişirlik krizisi diýip atlandyrylýan öňünde NLP sahası hem gyzyklanýar we netijeleriniň ýetişirlik bilen bilinçli bolýar. Son birnäçe ýyl bu ýerde täze başlangyşlar, bolup geçirmeler we aktiw barlamalary görýär. Ýöne bu ýer täzeliklik nähili üýtgetmeli, ölçeklenmeli we adrese edilmeli bir konsense ulaşmakdan uzakdır. Bu üns berýän täsiri bilen, NLP'da ýetişdirilişi barada ýetişdirilişi üçin golaýlaşýarys.", 'sw': 'Kupinga historia ya kile kilichoitwa mgogoro wa uzazi katika sayansi, uwanja wa NLP unaendelea kuwa na hamasa sana na kuhakikisha, uwajibikaji wa matokeo yake. Miaka michache iliyopita imeshuhudia mfululizo wa miradi mpya, matukio na utafiti wenye kazi katika eneo hilo. Hata hivyo, uwanja huo uko mbali na kufikia makubaliano kuhusiana na namna ya uwazi unavyopaswa kutambuliwa, kupigwa na kuelezwa, na maoni tofauti ya sasa yanaongezeka badala ya kubadilishana. Kwa mchango huu wenye msimamo mkali, tunalenga kutoa viwango vingi, na karibu kama inavyowezekana, picha ya kazi ya sasa kuhusu uwajibikaji wa NLP,', 'af': "Op die agtergrond van wat 'n reproduksibiliteitkrisis in wetenskap genoem is, word die NLP veld vergroter geinteresseer en bevestig oor die reproduksibiliteit van sy resultate. Die verlede paar jaar het 'n impressionele omvang van nuwe iniciatiewe, gebeurtenis en aktiewe ondersoek in die area gesien. Maar die veld is ver van die raak van 'n konsensus oor hoe reproduksibiliteit gedefinieer, gemeet en adreseer moet word, met verskeidigheid van besigtigings wat huidiglik vergroei word, eerder as konverkoering. Met hierdie fokuseerde bydrang, doen ons doel om 'n wyd-hoek te verskaf, en so naby as moontlik volledige, skerpskoot van huidige werk op reproduktiviteit in NLP,", 'ko': '과학계가 재현적 위기로 불리는 가운데 NLP 분야는 그 결과의 재현성에 점점 더 관심을 갖고 진지해지고 있다.지난 몇 년 동안 이 분야에는 일련의 인상적인 새로운 조치, 활동과 적극적인 연구가 출현했다.그러나 이 분야는 재현성을 어떻게 정의하고 평가하며 해결하는지에 대해 공감대를 형성하지 못하고 있으며, 현재의 관점의 다양성은 동일화되는 것이 아니라 증가하고 있다.이 중점 공헌을 통해 우리의 목표는 광각적이고 가능한 한 완전하며 NLP의 재현성에 관한 현재 작업의 스냅샷을 제공하는 것이다.', 'hy': 'Հակառակ գիտության վերարտադրողականության ճգնաժամի, ՆԼՀ-ի ոլորտը դառնում է ավելի հետաքրքրված իր արդյունքների վերարտադրողականության և գիտակցության մասին: Վերջին մի քանի տարիների ընթացքում այս ոլորտում նոր նախաձեռնություններ, իրադարձություններ և ակտիվ հետազոտություններ են տեսել: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս ոլորտում հեռու է հասնել հասկացության այն մասին, թե ինչպես պետք է վերարտադրողականությունը սահմանվի, չափվի և վերաբերվի, և տեսանկյունների բազմազանությունը ներկայումս աճում է, ոչ թե համընդհանուր Այս կենտրոնացված ներդրումով մենք նպատակում ենք տրամադրել լայն անկյուն և որքան հնարավոր է մոտ ամբողջական լուսանկար ՆԼՊ-ի վերարտադրողականության վերաբերյալ ներկայիս աշխատանքի վրա,', 'sq': 'Against the background of what has been termed a reproducibility crisis in science, the NLP field is becoming increasingly interested in, and conscientious about, the reproducibility of its results.  Vitet e fundit kanë parë një gamë mbresëlënëse nismesh, ngjarjesh dhe kërkimesh aktive në këtë fushë. Megjithatë, fusha është larg nga arritja e një konsensusi rreth sesi duhet të përcaktohet, të matet dhe të trajtohet riprodhueshmëria, me shumëllojshmërinë e pikëpamjeve në rritje aktualisht në vend të konvergencës. Me këtë kontribut të përqëndruar, ne synojmë të ofrojmë një kënd të gjerë, dhe sa më afër të jetë e mundur, fotografi të punës aktuale mbi riprodhimin në NLP,', 'am': 'በሳይንቀት የነፃነት ግጭት በተደረገው መሬት ላይ፣ የኤንLP መሬት በአደጋጋጋሚ እና ማስታወቂያው፣ ፍሬዎቹን በዝግጅት የሚወስደውን እና ማስተዋል፡፡ ባለፉት ጥቂት ዓመታት የአዲስ መዘዋወር፣ ሁኔታዎች እና የተግባር ምርጫዎች አግኝተዋል፡፡ ነገር ግን እርሻው እንዴት እንደሚለይ፣ እንዴት እንደሚለይ፣ የተለካ እና እንደተጨማሪው እውቀት ይደረጋል፡፡ በዚህ በተጠቃሚ አካሄድ የስፋት ክፍል እና በተቻለበት ቁጥር በNLP ላይ በብዛት የሚወስደውን ሥራ እናስቀራለን፡፡', 'bs': 'Prema pozadini onoga što se naziva kriza reproduktivnosti u nauci, polje NLP postaje sve više zainteresovano i svijesti o reproduktivnosti rezultata. Zadnjih nekoliko godina su vidjeli impresivni niz novih inicijativa, događaja i aktivnih istraživanja u tom području. Međutim, polje je daleko od postizanja konsenzusa o tome kako treba definirati, mjeriti i riješiti reproduktivnost, s raznolikošću pogleda koje se trenutno povećavaju umjesto konverzivanja. Uz taj usredotočeni doprinos, mi ciljamo pružiti širok kut, i što je bliže moguće potpuni snimak trenutnog rada o reproduktivnosti u NLP-u,', 'ca': "En el fons del que s'ha anomenat crisi de reproducibilitat en la ciència, el camp de la NLP està cada cop més interessat i conscient de la reproducibilitat dels seus resultats. Els darrers anys han vist una gama impressionant de noves iniciatives, esdeveniments i recerca activa en la zona. No obstant això, el camp està lluny d'arribar a un consens sobre com s'ha de definir, mesurar i abordar la reproducibilitat, amb la diversitat de vistes que actualment creix en lloc de convergir. Amb aquesta contribució centrada, busquem proporcionar una fotografia de la feina actual sobre la reproducibilitat en NLP a un angle ampli i tan aprop com possible completa,", 'az': "NLP sahəsi elmdə yenilənmək krizisi adlandırılmış olanın arxa plan üzərində, NLP sahəsi daha çox ilginə gəlir və sonuçlarının yenilənməsi barəsində bilin. Son bir neçə il bu bölgedə yeni başlanğıçlar, olaraq və fəaliyyətli araştırmalar təsirli bir səviyyə gördü. Halbuki, sahə yenilənmək, ölçülənmək və çəkilmək haqqında bir konsensə çatmaqdan uzaq, müxtəlif görüntülər birləşdirməkdən əvvəl böyüklənir. Bu təsirli işimizlə, NLP'də çox geniş bir köngücü sağlamaq və mümkün olduğu qədər tamamlamaq istəyirik.", 'bn': 'বিজ্ঞানের প্রবণতার সমস্যার বিরুদ্ধে এনএলপি ক্ষেত্রে ক্রমশ আগ্রহী এবং এর ফলাফলের প্রবণতার ব্যাপারে সচেতনতা প্রদান করছে। গত কয়েক বছর এই এলাকায় নতুন উদ্যোগ, অনুষ্ঠান এবং সক্রিয় গবেষণা দেখেছে। তবে ক্ষেত্রে কিভাবে প্রবণতা নির্ধারণ, পরিমাপ এবং ঠিকানা যাবার ব্যাপারে সম্মতি পৌঁছানোর ব্যাপারে ক্ষেত্রে অনেক দূরে যাচ্ছে যে  এই মনোযোগ প্রদানের মাধ্যমে আমরা একটি বিস্তারিত কোণ প্রদান করার উদ্দেশ্য নিয়েছি এবং যতটা সম্ভব, এনএলপিতে প্রবণতার উপর বর্তমান কাজের', 'cs': 'Na pozadí toho, co se ve vědě nazývá krizí reprodukovatelnosti, se obor NLP stále více zajímá o reprodukovatelnost výsledků. V posledních několika letech byla zaznamenána velká škála nových iniciativ, akcí a aktivního výzkumu v této oblasti. Tato oblast však zdaleka nedosáhla konsensu ohledně toho, jak by měla být reprodukovatelnost definována, měřena a řešena, přičemž rozmanitost názorů v současné době narůstá spíše než se sbližuje. Cílem tohoto zaměřeného příspěvku je poskytnout širokoúhlý a co nejblíže úplný snímek současné práce na reprodukovatelnosti v NLP,', 'id': 'Against the background of what has been termed a reproducibility crisis in science, the NLP field is becoming increasingly interested in, and conscientious about, the reproducibility of its results.  Beberapa tahun terakhir telah melihat jangkauan yang mengesankan dari inisiatif baru, peristiwa dan penelitian aktif di daerah ini. However, the field is far from reaching a consensus about how reproducibility should be defined, measured and addressed, with diversity of views currently increasing rather than converging.  With this focused contribution, we aim to provide a wide-angle, and as near as possible complete, snapshot of current work on reproducibility in NLP,', 'et': 'Arvestades seda, mida on nimetatud reprodutseeritavuse kriisiks teaduses, on uue tööprogrammi valdkond üha enam huvitatud tulemuste reprodutseeritavuse vastu ja tundlikum. Viimastel aastatel on valdkonnas näinud muljetavaldavat hulka uusi algatusi, üritusi ja aktiivseid teadusuuringuid. Kuid valdkond ei ole kaugeltki jõudnud konsensusele selle kohta, kuidas tuleks reprodutseeritavust määratleda, mõõta ja käsitleda, sest praegu on erinevad vaated pigem suurenemas kui ühtlustades. Selle keskendunud panuse eesmärk on anda lainurkne ja võimalikult peaaegu täielik ülevaade praegusest tööst taasesitatavuse alal NLP,', 'fi': 'Tieteessä niin sanotun toistettavuuskriisin taustalla NLP-ala on yhä kiinnostuneempi tulosten toistettavuudesta ja tietoisempi siitä. Viime vuosina on nähty vaikuttava valikoima uusia aloitteita, tapahtumia ja aktiivista tutkimusta alueella. Alalla ei kuitenkaan ole läheskään päästy yksimielisyyteen siitä, miten toistettavuus olisi määriteltävä, mitattava ja käsiteltävä, sillä näkemykset vaihtelevat tällä hetkellä pikemminkin kuin lähentyvät toisiaan. Tällä kohdennetulla panoksella pyrimme tarjoamaan laajan ja mahdollisimman kattavan tilannekuvan nykyisestä työstä uusittavuuden alalla NLP:ssä,', 'jv': 'Panjenengan segala punika ingkang diolah Panjenengan winih Panjenengan winih Panjenengan winih, jadak NLP kuwi isih luwih akeh piyambak, lan akeh nesalaipkan, akeh onjenengan langkung sampeyan bakal terus tambah paten. Awak dhéwé sing paling-toleh sing nêmên nganggo perbudhakan anyar tentang, akèh lan cendelo sing gawe nêmên. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Ing nganggep nggawe persok kuwi, kita aksi kanggo nyeleh uga ang wih-wih, lan kanggo meh peduli mberok, nggo nyonggo ngeruhake cara nLP,', 'ha': "Against the background of what has been termed a reproducibility crisis in science, the NLP field is becoming increasingly interested in, and conscientious about, the reproducibility of its results.  Ga shekara kaɗan sun ga masu kyakkyawan taskõki, masu shiryuwa da research masu haraka a cikin wannan. Babu zama mai nĩsa daga sami a sami game da yadda za'a bayyana, haƙullu da ake addu'a, da wasu viewõni masu ƙaranci a yanzu musamman. Ga wannan da ke zura da aikin da aka faɗa, za'a yi amfani da kiman faɗi, kuma kafin abin da ke iya kamfata, hoton aiki da ke kai yanzu a kan duba a cikin NLP,", 'sk': 'V ozadju tako imenovane krize ponovljivosti v znanosti se področje NLP vse bolj zanima in vestno zanima ponovljivost rezultatov. V zadnjih nekaj letih je na tem področju prišlo do izjemnega nabora novih pobud, dogodkov in aktivnih raziskav. Vendar pa na tem področju še zdaleč ni doseženo soglasja o tem, kako bi bilo treba opredeliti, meriti in obravnavati ponovljivost, saj se raznolikost stališč trenutno povečuje in ne zbližuje. S tem usmerjenim prispevkom želimo zagotoviti širokokotni in čim bližje popoln posnetek trenutnega dela na področju ponovljivosti v NLP,', 'bo': 'ཚན་རིག་ལ་ཕར་རིས་འཚོ་བ་ཞིག་ཟེར་བ་དང་། འདས་བའི་ལོ་ངོ་དག་པ་ཅིག་གིས་སྲོལ་ནས་འགོ་བཙུགས་བྱ་འགུལ་གསརཔ་དང་བྱ་འགུལ་བ་དང་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ འོན་ཀྱང་། འཛམ་གླིང་གི་ནང་དུ་ཅི་ཞིག་བསྐྱར་རིང་ངེས་འཛིན་བྱེད་དགོས་མིན་འདུག། With this focused contribution, we aim to provide a wide-angle, and as near as possible complete, snapshot of current work on reproducibility in NLP,', 'he': 'Against the background of what has been termed a reproducibility crisis in science, the NLP field is becoming increasingly interested in, and conscientious about, the reproducibility of its results.  The past few years have seen an impressive range of new initiatives, events and active research in the area.  בכל אופן, השטח רחוק מלהגיע לקונסונס לגבי איך ניתן להגדיר, למדוד ולהתייחס לשחזור, עם מגוון הנקודות מתגבר כרגע במקום להתחבר. עם התרומה המתמקדת הזו, אנו מתכוונים לספק צילום רחב, ובקרוב ככל האפשר, שלם של העבודה הנוכחית על התרבות ב NLP,'}
{'en': 'Semantic Oppositeness Assisted Deep Contextual Modeling for Automatic Rumor Detection in Social Networks', 'ar': 'ساعد التناقض الدلالي على النمذجة السياقية العميقة للكشف التلقائي عن الشائعات في الشبكات الاجتماعية', 'fr': 'Modélisation contextuelle approfondie assistée par opposition sémantique pour la détection automatique des rumeurs dans les réseaux sociaux', 'es': 'Modelado contextual profundo asistido por oposición semántica para la detección automática de rumores en redes sociales', 'pt': 'Modelagem Contextual Profunda Assistida por Oposições Semânticas para Detecção Automática de Rumores em Redes Sociais', 'ja': 'ソーシャルネットワークでの自動噂検出のためのセマンティック対立支援深いコンテキストモデリング', 'hi': 'शब्दार्थ विपरीतता सामाजिक नेटवर्क में स्वचालित अफवाह का पता लगाने के लिए गहरी प्रासंगिक मॉडलिंग की सहायता से', 'ru': 'Глубокое контекстное моделирование с помощью семантической противоположности для автоматического обнаружения слухов в социальных сетях', 'zh': '语义异向性佐深情建模,社交网络中自讹言', 'ga': 'Chuidigh Codarsnacht Shéimeantach le Samhaltú Doimhneach Comhthéacsúil chun Rumor a Bhrath go Uathoibríoch i Líonraí Sóisialta', 'hu': 'Szemantikus ellentét támogatott mély kontextuális modellezés a közösségi hálózatokban való automatikus pletykák felismeréséhez', 'el': 'Η Σημαντική Αντίθεση υποβοηθούμενη Μοντελοποίηση Βαθύ Περιεχομένου για Αυτόματη Ανίχνευση Φήμων στα Κοινωνικά Δίκτυα', 'kk': 'Жалпы желілерде автоматты түрде ауруларды анықтау үшін семантикалық қарсылығының көмектесетін терең контексті модель', 'lt': 'Semantic Oppositeness Assisted Deep Contextual Modeling for Automatic Rumor Detection in Social Networks', 'ka': 'სოციალური ქსელების სოციალური ქსელების სემანტიკური განსახულებაში სემანტიკური განსახულებელი დამხმარებელი კონტექსტური მოდელირება', 'ml': 'സെമാന്റിക് എതിര്\u200dപ്പിന്റെ ആഴത്തിലെ കൂട്ടത്തിലുള്ള മോഡലിങ് സോഷ്യല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കില്\u200d സ്വയം ഗുണവാക്കുകള്\u200d', 'it': 'Modellazione contestuale profonda assistita per il rilevamento automatico delle voci nei social network', 'mk': 'Семантична спротивност помогна во длабоко контекстно моделирање за автоматско детекција на гласини во социјалните мрежи', 'ms': 'Semantic Oppositeness Assisted Deep Contextual Modeling for Automatic Rumor Detection in Social Networks', 'pl': 'Semantyczna przeciwność wspomagana głębokim modelowaniem kontekstowym dla automatycznego wykrywania plotek w sieciach społecznościowych', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн сүлжээнд автоматжуулах дуу нээлттэй тогтоохын тулд Semantic Oppositeness Supported Deep Contextual Modeling for Automatic Rumor Detection in Social Networks', 'no': 'Semantisk motsetning støtta dypt kontekstmodellering for automatisk oppdaging av rumorer i sosiale nettverk', 'ro': 'Modelare contextuală profundă asistată pentru detectarea automată a zvonurilor în rețelele sociale', 'so': 'Semantic Opposite Assisted Deep Context Modeling for Automatic rumor detection in social networks', 'sr': 'Semantička suprotnost pomaže duboko kontekstualno modeliranje za automatsko otkrivanje glasina u socijalnim mrežama', 'si': 'සාමාජික ජාලයේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්වාසයෙන් සැමැන්තික විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විර', 'sv': 'Semantisk motsats assisterad djupkontextuell modellering för automatisk upptäckt av rykten i sociala nätverk', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'سوسیل نیٹورک میں سٹوٹ کی آواز شناسایی کے لئے سٹوٹی مخالفت کی مدد کی عمیق کنٹکسٹیول موڈلینگ', 'mt': 'Opożizzjoni Semantika Mmudellar Kuntest Profond assistit għall-Iskopri Awtomatiċi ta’ Rumori fin-Netwerks Soċjali', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chế độ lưỡng lự giữa kỳ với tốc độ Diện mạo lớn cho Phát hiện tin đồn tự động trên mạng xã hội', 'bg': 'Семантичната противоположност подпомага задълбочено контекстуално моделиране за автоматично откриване на слухове в социалните мрежи', 'da': 'Semantisk modstand assisteret dyb kontekstuel modellering til automatisk rygtedetektion i sociale netværk', 'hr': 'Semantička suprotnost pomoćna duboka kontekstualna modela za automatsko otkrivanje glasina u društvenim mrežama', 'nl': 'Semantic Oppositeness Assisted Deep Contextual Modeling voor automatische geruchtdetectie in sociale netwerken', 'de': 'Semantic Oppositeness Assisted Deep Contextual Modeling zur automatischen Geruchserkennung in sozialen Netzwerken', 'id': 'Opposisi Semantik Dibantu Modeling Konteksual Tepat untuk Deteksi Rumor Otomatis dalam Rangkaian Sosial', 'fa': 'مدل عمیق موقعیت عمیق برای شناسایی خنده\u200cهای خود در شبکه\u200cهای اجتماعی', 'ko': '의미 대립이 보조적인 소셜네트워크서비스 루머 자동 검출 심층 언어 환경 모델링', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Upinzani wa kimapenzi ulisaidiwa kwa Kiongozi wa Mambo ya Nchini kwa Kugundua Uvumbuzi wa Tamko katika mitandao ya kijamii', 'sq': 'Semantic Oppositeness Assisted Deep Contextual Modeling for Automatic Rumor Detection in Social Networks', 'tr': "Sosial Networks'lerde ýerleşmek üçin Semantik umytlary Destekleýän gaty Konteksual Modeli", 'am': 'Semantic Oppositosite Assisted Deep Contextual Modeling for Automatic Rumor Detection in Social Network', 'hy': 'Սեմանտիկ հակադրությունը օգնեց խորը կոնտեքստային մոդելներ սոցիալական ցանցերում ավտոմատիկ հնչյունների հայտնաբերման համար', 'az': '卯獹慬⁁쒟污狄녮摡⁁癴潭慴楫⁓쎼曃뱲⁔慮쒱浡珄넠쎼쎧쎼渠卥浡湴楫⁍쎼즙汬楦⁙慲擄녭揄녬쒱⁄敥瀠䍯湴數瑵慬⁍潤敬楮朊', 'bn': 'সামাজিক নেটওয়ার্কে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে গুজব সনাক্ত করার জন্য সেম্যান্টিক বিরোধী বিরোধীতার গভীর বিষয়বস্তু মড', 'ca': 'La resistència Semàtica va ajudar a modelar un contexte profund per a detectar rumors automàticament a les xarxes socials', 'cs': 'Sémantická opačnost podporovaná hlubokým kontextovým modelováním pro automatickou detekci zvěstí v sociálních sítích', 'fi': 'Semanttinen vastakkainasetteluavusteinen syvällinen kontekstuaalinen mallinnus automaattiseen huhujen havaitsemiseen sosiaalisissa verkostoissa', 'bs': 'Semantička suprotnost pomoći dubokom kontekstualnom modelu za automatsko otkrivanje glasina u socijalnim mrežama', 'et': 'Semantilise vastassuuna abistamine sügava konteksti modelleerimiseks automaatseks kuulujuttude tuvastamiseks sotsiaalvõrgustikes', 'jv': 'Oposis semanti Assisted deep contextual', 'sk': 'Semantno nasprotje podprto globinsko kontekstualno modeliranje za samodejno zaznavanje govoric v socialnih omrežjih', 'he': 'התנגדות סמנטית עזרה למדליגת תקשורת עמוקה לגלות שמועות אוטומטיות ברשתות חברתיות', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་ཐོག་ཏུ་Semantic Oppositeness Assisted Deep Contextual Modeling for Automatic Rumor Detection in Social Networks'}
{'en': 'Social networks face a major challenge in the form of rumors and fake news, due to their intrinsic nature of connecting users to millions of others, and of giving any individual the power to post anything. Given the rapid, widespread dissemination of information in social networks, manually detecting suspicious news is sub-optimal. Thus, research on automatic rumor detection has become a necessity. Previous works in the domain have utilized the reply relations between posts, as well as the semantic similarity between the main post and its context, consisting of replies, in order to obtain state-of-the-art performance. In this work, we demonstrate that semantic oppositeness can improve the performance on the task of rumor detection. We show that semantic oppositeness captures elements of discord, which are not properly covered by previous efforts, which only utilize semantic similarity or reply structure. We show, with extensive experiments on recent data sets for this problem, that our proposed model achieves state-of-the-art performance. Further, we show that our model is more resistant to the variances in performance introduced by randomness.', 'pt': 'As redes sociais enfrentam um grande desafio na forma de rumores e notícias falsas, devido à sua natureza intrínseca de conectar usuários a milhões de outros e de dar a qualquer indivíduo o poder de postar qualquer coisa. Dada a disseminação rápida e ampla de informações nas redes sociais, a detecção manual de notícias suspeitas não é o ideal. Assim, a pesquisa sobre detecção automática de rumores tornou-se uma necessidade. Trabalhos anteriores no domínio utilizaram as relações de resposta entre as postagens, bem como a semelhança semântica entre a postagem principal e seu contexto, constituído por respostas, para obter desempenho de última geração. Neste trabalho, demonstramos que a oposição semântica pode melhorar o desempenho na tarefa de detecção de rumores. Mostramos que a oposição semântica captura elementos de discórdia, que não são devidamente cobertos por esforços anteriores, que utilizam apenas similaridade semântica ou estrutura de resposta. Mostramos, com extensos experimentos em conjuntos de dados recentes para este problema, que nosso modelo proposto alcança desempenho de última geração. Além disso, mostramos que nosso modelo é mais resistente às variações de desempenho introduzidas pela aleatoriedade.', 'ar': 'تواجه الشبكات الاجتماعية تحديًا كبيرًا في شكل إشاعات وأخبار مزيفة ، نظرًا لطبيعتها الجوهرية في ربط المستخدمين بملايين الآخرين ، وإعطاء أي فرد القدرة على نشر أي شيء. نظرًا للانتشار السريع والواسع النطاق للمعلومات في الشبكات الاجتماعية ، فإن الكشف اليدوي عن الأخبار المشبوهة هو دون المستوى الأمثل. وبالتالي ، أصبح البحث عن الكشف التلقائي للشائعات ضرورة. استخدمت الأعمال السابقة في المجال علاقات الرد بين المنشورات ، فضلاً عن التشابه الدلالي بين المنشور الرئيسي وسياقه ، والذي يتكون من الردود ، من أجل الحصول على أحدث أداء. في هذا العمل ، نوضح أن التناقض الدلالي يمكن أن يحسن الأداء في مهمة الكشف عن الشائعات. نظهر أن التناقض الدلالي يلتقط عناصر الخلاف ، التي لم يتم تغطيتها بشكل صحيح من خلال الجهود السابقة ، والتي تستخدم فقط التشابه الدلالي أو بنية الرد. نوضح ، من خلال تجارب مكثفة على مجموعات البيانات الحديثة لهذه المشكلة ، أن نموذجنا المقترح يحقق أداءً متطورًا. علاوة على ذلك ، نظهر أن نموذجنا أكثر مقاومة للتغيرات في الأداء التي تقدمها العشوائية.', 'es': 'Las redes sociales se enfrentan a un gran desafío en forma de rumores y noticias falsas, debido a su naturaleza intrínseca de conectar a los usuarios con millones de personas y de dar a cualquier persona el poder de publicar cualquier cosa. Dada la difusión rápida y generalizada de la información en las redes sociales, la detección manual de noticias sospechosas no es óptima. Por lo tanto, la investigación sobre la detección automática de rumores se ha convertido en una necesidad. Los trabajos anteriores en el dominio han utilizado las relaciones de respuesta entre publicaciones, así como la similitud semántica entre la publicación principal y su contexto, que consiste en respuestas, para obtener un rendimiento de vanguardia. En este trabajo, demostramos que la opositividad semántica puede mejorar el rendimiento en la tarea de detección de rumores. Demostramos que la oposición semántica captura elementos de discordia, que no están adecuadamente cubiertos por esfuerzos anteriores, que solo utilizan similitud semántica o estructura de respuesta. Demostramos, con extensos experimentos en conjuntos de datos recientes para este problema, que nuestro modelo propuesto logra un rendimiento de vanguardia. Además, demostramos que nuestro modelo es más resistente a las variaciones en el rendimiento introducidas por la aleatoriedad.', 'fr': "Les réseaux sociaux sont confrontés à un défi majeur sous forme de rumeurs et de fake news, en raison de leur nature intrinsèque de connecter les utilisateurs à des millions d'autres, et de donner à tout individu le pouvoir de publier n'importe quoi. Compte tenu de la diffusion rapide et généralisée de l'information sur les réseaux sociaux, la détection manuelle des informations suspectes n'est pas optimale. La recherche sur la détection automatique des rumeurs est donc devenue une nécessité. Les travaux antérieurs dans le domaine ont utilisé les relations de réponse entre les messages, ainsi que la similitude sémantique entre le message principal et son contexte, constitué de réponses, afin d'obtenir des performances de pointe. Dans ce travail, nous démontrons que l'opposition sémantique peut améliorer les performances dans la tâche de détection de rumeurs. Nous montrons que l'opposition sémantique capture des éléments de discorde, qui ne sont pas correctement couverts par les efforts précédents, qui n'utilisent que la similitude sémantique ou la structure de réponse. Nous montrons, grâce à des expériences approfondies sur des ensembles de données récents pour ce problème, que le modèle que nous proposons atteint des performances de pointe. De plus, nous montrons que notre modèle est plus résistant aux variances de performance introduites par le caractère aléatoire.", 'ja': 'ソーシャルネットワークは、噂やフェイクニュースの形で大きな課題に直面しています。これは、ユーザーを何百万人もの人々とつなげ、個人に何かを投稿する権限を与えるという本質的な性質に起因しています。 ソーシャルネットワークでの情報の迅速かつ広範な普及を考えると、疑わしいニュースを手動で検出することは最適ではありません。 したがって、自動噂検出の研究が必要となってきた。 ドメイン内の以前の作品は、最先端のパフォーマンスを得るために、投稿間の返信関係と、返信からなるメインポストとそのコンテキストとの間の意味的な類似性を利用しています。 この研究では、意味的な対立性が噂検出のタスクのパフォーマンスを向上させることができることを示しています。 意味的相反性は、意味的類似性または応答構造のみを利用する、以前の努力によって適切にカバーされていない不協和音の要素を捕捉することを示しています。 この問題のための最近のデータセットの広範な実験により、提案されたモデルが最先端のパフォーマンスを達成していることが示されています。 さらに、私たちのモデルは、ランダム性によって導入されるパフォーマンスの差異に対してより耐性があることを示しています。', 'zh': '社交网络临讹言假新闻文之大挑战者,以其内系用户于数百万,而赋之以权也。 鉴信速于社交网络,泛泛传播,手动检测可疑新闻非理也。 是以自妄之言,已为一矣。 前事用帖之复,与其上下文(复)之语义相似性,以致先进之性。 此证语义对立性可以崇讹言检任之能。 吾明语义对立性获不和之元素,前力未得其覆盖,唯用语义相似性复构。 因其最新数集而多实验之,吾言先进之性也。 此外,表明我们模样更能抗随机性引入性能差别。', 'hi': 'सोशल नेटवर्क को अफवाहों और नकली समाचारों के रूप में एक बड़ी चुनौती का सामना करना पड़ता है, उपयोगकर्ताओं को लाखों अन्य लोगों से जोड़ने की उनकी आंतरिक प्रकृति के कारण, और किसी भी व्यक्ति को कुछ भी पोस्ट करने की शक्ति देने के कारण। सामाजिक नेटवर्क में जानकारी के तेजी से, व्यापक प्रसार को देखते हुए, मैन्युअल रूप से संदिग्ध समाचारों का पता लगाना उप-इष्टतम है। इस प्रकार, स्वचालित अफवाह का पता लगाने पर अनुसंधान एक आवश्यकता बन गई है। डोमेन में पिछले कार्यों ने पदों के बीच उत्तर संबंधों का उपयोग किया है, साथ ही साथ मुख्य पोस्ट और इसके संदर्भ के बीच शब्दार्थ समानता, जिसमें उत्तर शामिल हैं, ताकि अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त किया जा सके। इस काम में, हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि शब्दार्थ विपरीतता अफवाह का पता लगाने के कार्य पर प्रदर्शन में सुधार कर सकती है। हम दिखाते हैं कि शब्दार्थ विपरीतता कलह के तत्वों को पकड़ती है, जो पिछले प्रयासों द्वारा ठीक से कवर नहीं किए जाते हैं, जो केवल शब्दार्थ समानता या उत्तर संरचना का उपयोग करते हैं। हम इस समस्या के लिए हाल के डेटा सेट पर व्यापक प्रयोगों के साथ दिखाते हैं, कि हमारा प्रस्तावित मॉडल अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है। इसके अलावा, हम दिखाते हैं कि हमारा मॉडल यादृच्छिकता द्वारा पेश किए गए प्रदर्शन में विचरणों के लिए अधिक प्रतिरोधी है।', 'ru': 'Социальные сети сталкиваются с серьезной проблемой в виде слухов и фейковых новостей, из-за их внутренней природы подключения пользователей к миллионам других людей и предоставления любому человеку возможности размещать что-либо. Учитывая быстрое, широкое распространение информации в социальных сетях, обнаружение подозрительных новостей вручную не является оптимальным. Таким образом, исследования по автоматическому обнаружению слухов стали необходимостью. В предыдущих работах в этой области использовались отношения ответа между сообщениями, а также семантическое сходство между основной записью и ее контекстом, состоящим из ответов, для получения современной производительности. В этой работе мы демонстрируем, что семантическая противоположность может улучшить производительность по задаче обнаружения слухов. Показано, что семантическая противоположность охватывает элементы раздора, не охваченные должным образом предыдущими усилиями, которые используют только семантическое сходство или структуру ответа. Мы показываем, с обширными экспериментами на последних массивах данных для этой проблемы, что наша предлагаемая модель достигает современной производительности. Кроме того, мы показываем, что наша модель более устойчива к отклонениям в производительности, введенным случайностью.', 'ga': 'Tá dúshlán mór roimh líonraí sóisialta i bhfoirm ráflaí agus nuacht bhréige, mar gheall ar a nádúr intreach úsáideoirí a nascadh leis na milliúin daoine eile, agus an chumhacht a thabhairt d’aon duine aon rud a phostáil. I bhfianaise scaipeadh tapa, forleathan na faisnéise i líonraí sóisialta, tá sé fo-optamach nuacht amhrasach a bhrath de láimh. Mar sin, tá gá le taighde ar bhrath ráflaí go huathoibríoch. Bhain saothair roimhe seo san fhearann úsáid as an gcaidreamh freagra idir poist, chomh maith leis an gcosúlacht shéimeantach idir an príomhphost agus a chomhthéacs, ina bhfuil freagraí, chun feidhmíocht den scoth a bhaint amach. San obair seo, léirímid gur féidir le contrárthacht shéimeantach feabhas a chur ar fheidhmíocht an tasc a bhaineann le ráflaí a bhrath. Léirímid go mbíonn codarsnacht shéimeantach ag gabháil le gnéithe easaontais, nach bhfuil clúdaithe i gceart ag iarrachtaí roimhe seo, nach n-úsáideann ach cosúlacht shéimeantach nó struchtúr freagartha. Léirímid, le turgnaimh fhairsing ar thacair sonraí le déanaí don fhadhb seo, go mbaineann ár múnla molta feidhmíocht den scoth amach. Ina theannta sin, léirímid go bhfuil ár múnla níos frithsheasmhach in aghaidh na n-athraitheas feidhmíochta a thugtar isteach le randamacht.', 'ka': 'სოციალური ქსელების შესახებ ძალიან გამოცდილობა სიტყვების და ტალქტური ნუზების ფორმაში, რადგან ისინი ინტერნექტური სიტყვების შესახებ მომხმარებელი მილიონის სხვებისთან დაკავ სოციალური ქსელებში ინფორმაციის გახსნა ძალიან, გარჩეველი გახსნა, მანძილურად შეიძლებელი ინფორმაციის გახსნა არის სპოტიმალური. ამიტომ, ავტომატური სიტყვის განვიცემების შესახებ უნდა იყოს. პირველი სამუშაოში სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო დაკავშირებების შესახებ, რომელიც სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო დაკავშირება, რომელიც სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო პოს ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ სემონტიკური მოცემულობა შეუძლია უფრო მუშაობა სიტყვების განვიცემულება. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ სემონტიკური მოცემულობა აღმოჩნდება განსხვავებული ელემენტები, რომლებიც არ მხოლოდ უკეთესი მოცემულებებით, რომლებიც მხოლოდ სემონტიკურ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, ახალი მონაცემების კონფიმენტებით ამ პრობლემას, რომ ჩვენი მონაცემები მოდელის შესაძლებლობა შეიძლება გავაკეთოთ ხელსაწყისას. დამატებით ჩვენ ჩვენი მოდელი უფრო სხვადასხვა გარიანციებისთვის, რომლებიც გამოყენებული შემთხვევაზე.', 'el': 'Τα κοινωνικά δίκτυα αντιμετωπίζουν μια μεγάλη πρόκληση με τη μορφή φήμων και ψεύτικων ειδήσεων, λόγω της εγγενής τους φύσης να συνδέουν τους χρήστες με εκατομμύρια άλλους και να δίνουν σε κάθε άτομο τη δυνατότητα να δημοσιεύει οτιδήποτε. Δεδομένης της ταχείας, ευρείας διάδοσης πληροφοριών στα κοινωνικά δίκτυα, η χειροκίνητη ανίχνευση ύποπτων ειδήσεων δεν είναι βέλτιστη. Έτσι, η έρευνα για την αυτόματη ανίχνευση φήμων έχει γίνει μια αναγκαιότητα. Προηγούμενα έργα στον τομέα έχουν χρησιμοποιήσει τις σχέσεις απάντησης μεταξύ των δημοσιεύσεων, καθώς και τη σημασιολογική ομοιότητα μεταξύ της κύριας ανάρτησης και του πλαισίου της, που αποτελείται από απαντήσεις, προκειμένου να επιτευχθεί η απόδοση τελευταίας τεχνολογίας. Σε αυτή την εργασία, καταδεικνύουμε ότι η σημασιολογική αντίθεση μπορεί να βελτιώσει την απόδοση στο έργο της ανίχνευσης φήμων. Δείχνουμε ότι η σημασιολογική αντίθεση συλλαμβάνει στοιχεία διαφωνίας, τα οποία δεν καλύπτονται σωστά από προηγούμενες προσπάθειες, τα οποία χρησιμοποιούν μόνο σημασιολογική ομοιότητα ή δομή απάντησης. Δείχνουμε, με εκτεταμένα πειράματα σε πρόσφατα σύνολα δεδομένων για αυτό το πρόβλημα, ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο επιτυγχάνει επιδόσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας. Επιπλέον, δείχνουμε ότι το μοντέλο μας είναι πιο ανθεκτικό στις διακυμάνσεις στην απόδοση που εισάγονται από την τυχαιότητα.', 'hu': 'A közösségi hálózatok komoly kihívással néznek szembe pletykák és hamis hírek formájában, mivel belső természetük, hogy a felhasználókat több millió másikhoz kapcsolják össze, és bárkinek megadják a hatalmat, hogy bármit tegyen közzé. Tekintettel az információk gyors és széles körű terjesztésére a közösségi hálózatokban, a gyanús hírek manuális felismerése nem optimális. Így szükségessé vált az automatikus pletykák felismerésére irányuló kutatás. A korábbi munkák a bejegyzések közötti válaszviszonyokat, valamint a főbejegyzés és a válaszokból álló kontextus szemantikai hasonlóságát használták fel a korszerű teljesítmény elérése érdekében. Ebben a munkában bebizonyítjuk, hogy a szemantikai ellentét javíthatja a pletykák felismerésének feladata teljesítményét. Megmutatjuk, hogy a szemantikai ellentét a korábbi erőfeszítések nem fedik le megfelelően a viszálytalanság elemeit, amelyek csak szemantikai hasonlóságot vagy válaszstruktúrát használnak. Az erre a problémára a legújabb adatkészleteken végzett kiterjedt kísérletekkel megmutatjuk, hogy javasolt modellünk korszerű teljesítményt ér el. Továbbá megmutatjuk, hogy modellünk ellenáll a véletlenszerűség által bevezetett teljesítményváltozásoknak.', 'it': "I social network affrontano una grande sfida sotto forma di rumor e fake news, a causa della loro intrinseca natura di collegare gli utenti a milioni di altri, e di dare a qualsiasi individuo il potere di pubblicare qualsiasi cosa. Data la rapida e diffusa diffusione delle informazioni sui social network, rilevare manualmente notizie sospette è subottimale. Pertanto, la ricerca sul rilevamento automatico delle voci è diventata una necessità. I lavori precedenti nel settore hanno utilizzato le relazioni di risposta tra i post, nonché la somiglianza semantica tra il post principale e il suo contesto, costituito da risposte, al fine di ottenere performance all'avanguardia. In questo lavoro, dimostriamo che l'opposizione semantica può migliorare le prestazioni sul compito di rilevazione di rumor. Mostriamo che l'opposizione semantica cattura elementi di discordia, che non sono adeguatamente coperti da sforzi precedenti, che utilizzano solo somiglianza semantica o struttura di risposta. Mostriamo, con ampi esperimenti su set di dati recenti per questo problema, che il nostro modello proposto raggiunge prestazioni all'avanguardia. Inoltre, mostriamo che il nostro modello è più resistente alle variazioni di prestazioni introdotte dalla casualità.", 'lt': 'Social networks face a major challenge in the form of rumors and fake news, due to their intrinsic nature of connecting users to millions of others, and of giving any individual the power to post anything.  Given the rapid, widespread dissemination of information in social networks, manually detecting suspicious news is sub-optimal.  Thus, research on automatic rumor detection has become a necessity.  Previous works in the domain have utilized the reply relations between posts, as well as the semantic similarity between the main post and its context, consisting of replies, in order to obtain state-of-the-art performance.  Šiame darbe parodomi, kad semantinis priešingumas gali pagerinti garsų aptikimo užduotį. Mes rodome, kad semantinis priešingumas apima nesutarimų elementus, kurie nėra tinkamai aprėpti ankstesnėmis pastangomis, kurios naudoja tik semantinį panašumą ar atsakymo struktūrą. We show, with extensive experiments on recent data sets for this problem, that our proposed model achieves state-of-the-art performance.  Be to, mes rodome, kad mūsų model is yra atsparesnis atsitiktinės atrankos sukeltiems veiklos skirtumams.', 'ms': 'Rangkaian sosial menghadapi cabaran besar dalam bentuk khabar angin dan berita palsu, disebabkan sifat intrinsik mereka menghubungkan pengguna dengan jutaan orang lain, dan memberikan setiap individu kuasa untuk memposting apa-apa. Mengingat penyebaran maklumat yang cepat dan luas dalam rangkaian sosial, mengesan berita mencurigakan secara manual adalah tidak optimal. Thus, research on automatic rumor detection has become a necessity.  Kerja-kerja terdahulu dalam domain telah menggunakan hubungan jawapan diantara pos, serta persamaan semantik diantara pos utama dan konteks, yang terdiri dari jawapan, untuk mendapatkan prestasi state-of-the-art. Dalam kerja ini, kita menunjukkan bahawa kebelakangan semantik boleh meningkatkan prestasi pada tugas pengesan khabar angin. Kami menunjukkan bahawa kebelakangan semantik menangkap unsur perbezaan, yang tidak ditutup dengan betul oleh usaha terdahulu, yang hanya menggunakan persamaan semantik atau struktur balas. Kami menunjukkan, dengan eksperimen luas pada set data baru-baru ini untuk masalah ini, bahawa model kami diusulkan mencapai prestasi terbaik. Lagipun, kita menunjukkan bahawa model kita lebih resisten kepada variasi dalam prestasi yang diperkenalkan oleh rawak.', 'kk': 'Әлеуметтік желілер жаңалықтар мен жалғыз жаңалықтар түрінде маңызды көмектеседі, олардың миллиондарды басқаларға қосылу үшін, әрбір адамға ешқандай қуатты жіберу үшін қуатты беру үшін. Жаңалықтарды қолмен табуға көмектесетін жаңалықтарды көмектесетін, көмектесетін мәліметтердің желіктерінің тез таратылуын көрсету үшін, көмектесетін жаңалықтарды Бұл үшін автоматты жаңалықтарды анықтау зерттеу қажет болды. Домендегі алдыңғы жұмыс жауаптар арасындағы жауаптар қатынасын және негізгі пошта мен оның контексті арасындағы семантикалық ұқсас қатынасын қолданып, жауаптардан тұрады. Жұмыс істеу үшін. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, семантикалық қарсылықтығы дыбыс анықтау тапсырмасындағы жұмысын жақсарту мүмкіндігін көрсетеді. Біз семантикалық қарсылықтығы дискрептің элементтерін түсіндіреді. Бұл өткен әрекеттері дұрыс емес. Бұл тек semantic ұқсас не жауап құрылымын қолданады. Біз бұл мәселе үшін жаңа деректер жиындарының кеңейтілген тәжірибелерімізді көрсеткіздік. Біздің ұсынған моделіміз өзгертілген күй- жайымдық жұмыс Қосымша, біз үлгіміз кездейсоқ істеу арқылы істейтін варианттарға қарсы деп көрсетеді.', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн сүлжээнд дуу, хуурамч мэдээ хэлбэрээр маш чухал асуудалтай байдаг. Хэрэглэгчийг сая сая хүнтэй холбоотой болон хүн бүрт ямар ч зүйлийг илгээх эрх мэдэл өгөх боломжтой. Нийгмийн сүлжээнд мэдээллийн хурдан, өргөн тархалтын тулд, санамсаргүй мэдээг гараараа олж мэдэх нь бага зэрэг сайн байдаг. Тэгэхээр автоматик дуу нээлттэй судалгаа хэрэгтэй болсон. Холбооны өмнөх ажлын хариултын харилцааны хариултын харилцааны хэрэглээ, хамгийн чухал зүйл болон нөхцөл байдлын хоорондын семантик ижил харилцааны хариултын харилцаа ашиглаж байна. Энэ ажлын тулд бид зэрэгцээ эсрэг байдал сонсолт мэдээллийн даалгаврыг сайжруулж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бид зөвхөн semantic эсрэг эсрэг нь өмнөх хичээл дээр дүгнэгдэхгүй, зөвхөн semantic similarity эсвэл хариултын бүтцийг ашигладаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бид энэ асуудлын саяхан өгөгдлийн хэмжээний туршилтуудыг харуулж байна. Бидний санал өгсөн загвар нь урлагийн үйл ажиллагааны орчин чадвартай. Дараа нь, бидний загвар нь санамсаргүй байдлаар танилцуулсан үйл ажиллагааны өөрчлөлтийг илүү эсэргүүцэж байгааг харуулж байна.', 'ml': 'കോടികണക്കിന് കോടികണക്കിന് വേണ്ടി ഉപയോക്താക്കളെ ബന്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനാലും, ഏതെങ്കിലും പോസ്റ്റ് ചെയ്യാനുള്ള ശക്തിയെല്ലാം കൊടു വേഗം, വിശാലമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സോഷ്യല്\u200d നെറ്റുകളില്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നത് കൊണ്ട്, സംശയിക്കുന്ന വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d കൈകാര്യം കണ്ടുപ അതുകൊണ്ട്, സ്വയം വാക്കുകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി പഠിക്കാന്\u200d ആവശ്യമാണ്. പോസ്റ്റുകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള മറുപടി ബന്ധങ്ങളും, പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പോസ്റ്റിനും അതിന്റെ കൂട്ടത്തിനും തമ്മിലുള്ള സാമാന്റിക്ക് തുല്യമായ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപ In this work, we demonstrate that semantic oppositeness can improve the performance on the task of rumor detection.  നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നത് സെമാന്റിക്ക് എതിര്\u200dപ്പുണ്ടാക്കുന്ന വിഭിപ്രായത്തിന്റെ മൂലകങ്ങളെ പിടികൂടുന്നു. അത് മു ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തിനുവേണ്ടി അടുത്ത വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച മോഡല്\u200d സ്ഥാ അതിനുശേഷം, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രകടനത്തിലെ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്കെതിരാണെന്നാണ്.', 'pl': 'Sieci społecznościowe stoją przed poważnym wyzwaniem w postaci plotek i fałszywych wiadomości, ze względu na ich wewnętrzną naturę łączenia użytkowników z milionami innych i dawania każdej osobie możliwości publikowania wszystkiego. Biorąc pod uwagę szybkie i powszechne rozpowszechnianie informacji w sieciach społecznościowych, ręczne wykrywanie podejrzanych wiadomości jest nieoptymalne. Dlatego badania nad automatycznym wykrywaniem plotek stały się koniecznością. Poprzednie prace w tej dziedzinie wykorzystały relacje odpowiedzi pomiędzy postami, a także semantyczne podobieństwo pomiędzy głównym postem a jego kontekstem, składającym się z odpowiedzi, w celu uzyskania najnowocześniejszej performancji. W niniejszej pracy pokazujemy, że semantyczna przeciwieństwo może poprawić wydajność wykrywania plotek. Pokazujemy, że semantyczna przeciwieństwo uchwyta elementy niezgody, które nie są odpowiednio pokryte poprzednimi wysiłkami, które wykorzystują jedynie semantyczne podobieństwo lub strukturę odpowiedzi. Dzięki obszernym eksperymentom na najnowszych zbiorach danych dotyczących tego problemu pokazujemy, że proponowany model osiąga najnowocześniejszą wydajność. Ponadto pokazujemy, że nasz model jest bardziej odporny na różnice wydajności wprowadzane przez losowość.', 'mk': 'Социјалните мрежи се соочуваат со голем предизвик во форма на гласини и лажни вести, поради нивната внатрешна природа на поврзување на корисниците со милиони други, и давање на секој индивидуал моќ да објавува било што. Со оглед на брзото и широкото ширење на информациите во социјалните мрежи, рачно откривањето на сомнителните вести е неоптимално. Thus, research on automatic rumor detection has become a necessity.  Previous works in the domain have utilized the reply relations between posts, as well as the semantic similarity between the main post and its context, consisting of replies, in order to obtain state-of-the-art performance.  Во оваа работа, демонстрираме дека семантичната спротивност може да ја подобри изведбата на задачата за детекција на гласини. Ние покажуваме дека семантичната спротивност ги фати елементите на несогласување, кои не се соодветно покриени од претходните напори, кои користат само семантична сличност или структура на одговор. Ние покажуваме, со експерименти на неодамнешните податоци за овој проблем, дека нашиот предложен модел постигнува најдобра изведба. Further, we show that our model is more resistant to the variances in performance introduced by randomness.', 'mt': 'In-netwerks soċjali jiffaċċjaw sfida kbira fil-form a ta’ rumori u a ħbarijiet foloz, minħabba n-natura intrinsika tagħhom li jgħaqqdu lill-utenti ma’ miljuni ta’ oħrajn, u li jagħtu lil kull individwu s-setgħa li jippubblika xi ħaġa. Minħabba t-tixrid rapidu u mifrux tal-informazzjoni fin-netwerks soċjali, is-sejba manwali ta’ aħbarijiet suspettużi mhijiex ottimali. Thus, research on automatic rumor detection has become a necessity.  Ix-xogħlijiet preċedenti fid-dominju użaw ir-relazzjonijiet ta’ tweġiba bejn il-karigi, kif ukoll is-similarità semantika bejn il-kariga ewlenija u l-kuntest tagħha, li tikkonsisti minn tweġibiet, sabiex tinkiseb prestazzjoni avvanzata. In this work, we demonstrate that semantic oppositeness can improve the performance on the task of rumor detection.  We show that semantic oppositeness captures elements of discord, which are not properly covered by previous efforts, which only utilize semantic similarity or reply structure.  Aħna nuru, b’esperimenti estensivi fuq settijiet ta’ dejta reċenti għal din il-problema, li l-mudell propost tagħna jilħaq l-aħjar prestazzjoni. Barra minn hekk, nuru li l-mudell tagħna huwa aktar reżistenti għall-varjazzjonijiet fil-prestazzjoni introdotti b’mod każwali.', 'sr': 'Socijalne mreže suočavaju se sa velikim izazovom u obliku glasina i lažnih vijesti, zbog njihove unutrašnje prirode povezivanja korisnika sa milijunima drugih, i dajući svakom pojedincu moć da postavi bilo šta. S obzirom na brzo, široko širenje informacija u društvenim mrežama, ručno otkrivanje sumnjivih vesti je podoptimalno. Dakle, istraživanje o automatskom otkrivanju glasina postalo je potrebno. Prethodni radovi u domenu koristili su odgovorne odnose između postaja, kao i semantičku sličnost između glavnog posta i njegovog konteksta, u skladu sa odgovorima, kako bi dobili postupne funkcije umjetnosti. U ovom poslu pokazujemo da semantička suprotnost može poboljšati izvršnost zadatka otkrivanja glasina. Pokazujemo da semantička suprotnost uhvati elemente diskriminacije, koje nisu propisno pokrivene prethodnim naporima, koji koriste samo semantičku sličnost ili strukturu odgovora. Mi pokazujemo, sa velikim eksperimentima na nedavnim setima podataka za ovaj problem, da naš predloženi model postigne izvršnost stanja umjetnosti. Nadalje, pokazujemo da je naš model otporniji na varijanse u izvedbi predstavljene sluèajnošću.', 'so': 'Internetka bulshada waxay u jeedaan dhibaato weyn sida waran iyo warar been ah, sababtoo ah dabiicadda hoose ee isticmaalayaasha la xiriira milyan oo kale, iyo in qof kasta la siiyo amar uu ku qoro wax kasta. Wixii macluumaadka ku saabsan sooshaalka bulshada, si dhaqso ah oo ballaadhan lagu kala faafiyo, wuxuu si rasmi ah u ogaanayaa warar shaki leh. Sidaa darteed, baaritaanka ku saabsan baaritaanka warqada ah Shaqooyinkii hore ee gudaha ku yaalay waxay isticmaaleen xiriirka jawaabta ee warqadaha u dhexeeya, sidoo kale isku mid ahaanshaha u dhexeeya boostada hoose iyo mukhtadiisa, waxayna ka mid yihiin jawaabo si uu u helo xaalada farshaxanka. Shaqadan, waxaynu muujinnaa in difaac ka gees ah uu horumarin karo shaqo la ogaanayo warqada. Waxaynu muujinnaa in kooxaha kala geesta ah ay qabsadaan qaybaha rabshadda, taasoo aan si hagaagsan ugu qarsoonayn hawshooyinkii hore, taas oo kaliya isticmaalaya tusaale u eg ama jidhka jawaabta. We show, with extensive experiments on recent data sets for this problem, that our proposed model achieves state-of-the-art performance.  Further, waxaynu muujinnaa in modellkayagu ay ka hor joogsato kala duwanaanshaha ku saabsan tababarka la soo bandhigay sinnaanta.', 'sv': 'Sociala nätverk står inför en stor utmaning i form av rykten och falska nyheter, på grund av deras inneboende natur att ansluta användare till miljontals andra, och att ge varje individ makten att posta något. Med tanke på den snabba och utbredda spridningen av information i sociala nätverk är det inte optimalt att manuellt upptäcka misstänkta nyheter. Således har forskning om automatisk ryktesdetektering blivit en nödvändighet. Tidigare arbeten inom området har använt sig av svarsrelationerna mellan inlägg, liksom den semantiska likheten mellan huvudinlägget och dess sammanhang, bestående av svar, för att uppnå toppmodern prestanda. I detta arbete visar vi att semantisk motsats kan förbättra prestationen på uppgiften att upptäcka rykten. Vi visar att semantisk motsats fångar element av oenighet, som inte täcks ordentligt av tidigare ansträngningar, som endast använder semantisk likhet eller svarsstruktur. Vi visar, med omfattande experiment på senaste datauppsättningar för detta problem, att vår föreslagna modell uppnår toppmoderna prestanda. Vidare visar vi att vår modell är mer motståndskraftig mot variationer i prestanda som introduceras av slumpmässighet.', 'no': 'Sosiale nettverk står med ein stor utfordring i form av rumorer og falske nyhetar, grunnen av sine intrinsiske natur for å kopla brukarar til millioner av andre, og å gi alle individuelle makten til å post noko. Gjennomsiktig raskt, utvida utspredning av informasjon i sosiale nettverk, er underoptimal å oppdaga manuelt sikkerte nyhetar. Så forskning om automatisk oppdaging av rumorer er nødvendig. Førre arbeidar i domenet har brukt svarrelasjonane mellom postar, og semantiske liknande mellom hovudposten og konteksten, som inneheld av svarar, for å få tilstand til kunstfullføring. I denne arbeiden viser vi at semantiske motstandar kan forbetra utviklinga på oppgåva for oppdaging av rumorer. Vi viser at semantiske motstandsstyrke avhentar elementar av discord, som ikkje er rett dekka av tidlegare forsøk, som berre brukar semantiske liknande eller svarstruktur. Vi viser, med utvida eksperimenter på nyleg datasett for dette problemet, at vår foreslått modell når det gjer tilstanden av kunsten. I tillegg viser vi at modellen vårt er meir resistant til variansane i utviklinga som er innført av tilfeldighet.', 'ro': 'Rețelele sociale se confruntă cu o provocare majoră sub formă de zvonuri și știri false, datorită naturii lor intrinsece de a conecta utilizatorii la milioane de alții și de a da oricărui individ puterea de a posta orice. Având în vedere diseminarea rapidă și răspândită a informațiilor în rețelele sociale, detectarea manuală a știrilor suspecte este suboptimă. Astfel, cercetarea privind detectarea automată a zvonurilor a devenit o necesitate. Lucrările anterioare din domeniu au utilizat relațiile de răspuns dintre posturi, precum și similaritatea semantică dintre postul principal și contextul acestuia, constând în răspunsuri, pentru a obține performanțe de ultimă generație. În această lucrare, demonstrăm că opoziția semantică poate îmbunătăți performanța în sarcina detectării zvonurilor. Noi arătăm că opoziția semantică captează elemente de discordie, care nu sunt acoperite în mod corespunzător de eforturile anterioare, care utilizează doar similitudinea semantică sau structura de răspuns. Noi arătăm, prin experimente ample pe seturi de date recente pentru această problemă, că modelul nostru propus atinge performanțe de ultimă generație. Mai mult, arătăm că modelul nostru este mai rezistent la variațiile de performanță introduse de întâmplare.', 'si': 'සාමාජික ජාලයේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ බොරු වාර්තාවක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනවා, ඔවුන් අනිත් මිලියන් සමග සම්බන් සාමාජික ජාලයේ තොරතුරු ගැන වේගයෙන්, ප්\u200dරවේගයෙන් විස්තර විස්තර විස්තර කරලා තියෙනවා, සැකසුම් වාර්තා ඉතින්, ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක කිව්වා හොයාගන්න අවශ්\u200dයයක් වුනා. පොස්ට්ස් අතර ප්\u200dරතිචාර සම්බන්ධතාවක් සහ ප්\u200dරධාන පොස්ට්ස් සම්බන්ධතාවක් අතර ප්\u200dරතිචාර සම්බන්ධතාවක් භාවිත කරලා තියෙනවා, ප්\u200dරති මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා. අපි පෙන්වන්නේ සෙමැන්ටික් විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විශේෂතාවක් අල්ලගන්නවා කියල අපි පෙන්වන්නේ, මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් අලුත් දත්ත සේට් එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරපු මොඩේ තවත්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් එක තරම් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය කරන්නේ කියලා.', 'ta': 'சமூக வலைப்பின்னல்கள் பொய் மற்றும் பொய் செய்திகள் வடிவத்தில் ஒரு மிகப்பெரிய சவால் முகம் நேர்ந்து கொள்கிறது, அவர்களுடைய உள்ளூர்ந்த செய்த சார்ந்த வலைப்பின்னலில் தகவல்களை விரைவாக, விரிவாக, விரிவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, சந்தேகமான செய்திகளை கண்டுபிடிப்பது துண அதனால், தானாகவே விசாரணையை கண்டுபிடிப்பது ஒரு தேவையாக இருக்கிறது. முந்தைய வேலைகள் பதில் உள்ள தொடர்புகளுக்கு இடையே பயன்படுத்தியுள்ளார் இந்த வேலையில், நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் பெரும்பாலான எதிர்ப்பு எதிர்பார்த்தல் கூற்று கண்டுபிடிப்பதின் செயல We show that semantic oppositeness captures elements of discord, which are not properly covered by previous efforts, which only utilize semantic similarity or reply structure.  அண்மையில் இந்த பிரச்சனைக்கான தகவல் அமைப்புகளின் விரிவான சோதனைகளைக் காண்பிக்கிறோம், நம் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதி மேலும், நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் எங்கள் மாதிரி குறிப்பிடாத மாறுபாடுகளுக்கு மிக எதிர்பாக இருக்கும் என்று.', 'ur': 'سوسیل نیٹورک کی وجہ سے افسانے اور جھوٹی خبریں کی شکل میں ایک بڑی چال کے سامنے موجود ہوتے ہیں، ان کے دل میں ان لوگوں کو لاکھوں اور لاکھوں اور کسی شخص کو پوسٹ کرنے کے لئے قدرت عطا کرنے کے سبب۔ سوسیل نیٹورک میں اطلاعات کی سریع اور گھیری پھیلائی کی وجہ سے، مضطرب خبریں جاننے کے ذریعہ مضطرب ہونے کا غیر اچھا ہے. اسی طرح، آٹوٹی افسانہ شناسایی کا تحقیق ضرورت ہو گیا ہے۔ ڈومین میں پہلے کام پوسٹوں کے درمیان جواب کے ارتباط کا استعمال کیا گیا ہے، اور اس کے منظم پوسٹ اور اس کے منظم کے درمیان سیمنٹی برابری کا استعمال کیا گیا ہے، جواب کے باعث ہے، تاکہ وہ اضطراری کی عملکرد حاصل کرے۔ ہم اس کام میں دکھاتے ہیں کہ سیمنٹی مخالفت افسوس شناسایی کے کام پر عمل کو بہتر کر سکتی ہے۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ سیمانتیک مخالفت اختلاف کے عنصروں کو پکڑتا ہے جو پہلے کی کوشش سے اچھی طرح نہیں پورے ہیں، جو صرف سیمانتیک برابری یا جواب کی ساختگی کے مطابق استعمال کرتے ہیں. ہم اس مسئلہ کے لئے اگلے ڈیٹا سٹ کے بارے میں بڑے تجربے کے ساتھ دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری پیشنهاد مدل آهنت کے کامیابی کو پہنچاتا ہے۔ اور ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا موڈل طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح سے پیش کیا گیا ہے۔', 'uz': "Name Taqqi, jamiyatlar tarmoqlarida maʼlumot tarmoqni ajratish uchun qoʻlbola qilish qo'llanmagan yangilarni aniqlash mumkin. Shunday qilib, avtomatik so'zni aniqlashni o'rganish kerak. Name Bu vazifanda, biz semantik rivojlanishini anglatamiz, so'zlar qiziqarishning vazifasini oshirish mumkin. Ko'rsatganimiz, semantik rivojlanuvchi murakkablarining elementlarini ko'rsatamiz. Bu birinchi harakatlar tomonidan faqat semantik bir xil yoki javob tuzilishidan foydalanadi. Biz bu muammo uchun eng yaqin maʼlumotlar tarkibida katta tajriba bilan ko'ramiz, ilova qilingan modelmiz shu shaxsiy bajarish holatini bajaradi. Koʻrsatganimiz, biz modelmiz chegaralik bilan ishga tushirilgan varianlarni ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Mạng xã hội phải đối mặt với một thử thách lớn bằng những tin đồn và tin giả, bởi vì bản chất của họ là liên kết người dùng với hàng triệu người khác, và cho bất cứ ai sức mạnh để đăng tải bất cứ thứ gì. Do thông tin nhanh chóng và phổ biến trên mạng xã hội, việc phát hiện tin đáng ngờ không phải là tối ưu. Nghiên cứu về việc phát hiện tin đồn tự động đã trở thành cần thiết. Những tác phẩm trước trong lĩnh vực đã tận dụng quan hệ trả lời giữa các bài, cũng như sự giống nhau theo ngữ nghĩa giữa bài chủ chốt và bối cảnh của nó, gồm những câu trả lời, để đạt được những hiệu ứng hiện đại nhất thời. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi chứng minh rằng sự đối lập ngữ nghĩa có thể cải thiện hiệu quả trong việc khám phá tin đồn. Chúng tôi cho thấy rằng sự đối lập ngữ nghĩa nắm giữ các yếu tố bất hòa, mà không được bao gồm những nỗ lực trước đây, mà chỉ sử dụng nét giống nhau hoặc cấu trúc trả lời. Chúng tôi cho thấy, với các thí nghiệm đầy đủ trên các bộ dữ liệu mới cho vấn đề này, mô hình chúng tôi đề nghị đạt được hiệu quả hiện đại. Thêm nữa, chúng tôi cho thấy mô hình của chúng tôi có khả năng chịu đựng nhiều biến đổi trong khả năng ngẫu nhiên.', 'bg': 'Социалните мрежи са изправени пред голямо предизвикателство под формата на слухове и фалшиви новини, поради присъщия им характер да свързват потребителите с милиони други и да дават на всеки индивид силата да публикува каквото и да е. Предвид бързото, широко разпространено разпространение на информация в социалните мрежи, ръчното откриване на подозрителни новини не е оптимално. По този начин изследването на автоматичното откриване на слухове се превърна в необходимост. Предишни творби в областта са използвали отношенията на отговорите между публикациите, както и семантичното сходство между основната публикация и нейния контекст, състоящ се от отговори, за да се получи най-съвременно представяне. В тази работа демонстрираме, че семантичната противоположност може да подобри изпълнението на задачата за откриване на слухове. Показваме, че семантичната противоположност улавя елементи на несъгласие, които не са правилно обхванати от предишни усилия, които използват само семантична сходство или структура на отговор. Ние показваме, с обширни експерименти върху последните набори от данни за този проблем, че нашият предложен модел постига най-съвременни резултати. Освен това показваме, че нашият модел е по-устойчив на вариациите в производителността, въведени от случайността.', 'nl': 'Sociale netwerken worden geconfronteerd met een grote uitdaging in de vorm van geruchten en nepnieuws, vanwege hun intrinsieke aard van het verbinden van gebruikers met miljoenen anderen, en het geven van elk individu de macht om iets te posten. Gezien de snelle, wijdverspreide verspreiding van informatie in sociale netwerken is het handmatig detecteren van verdacht nieuws suboptimaal. Daarom is onderzoek naar automatische geruchtdetectie een noodzaak geworden. Eerdere werken in het domein hebben gebruik gemaakt van de antwoordrelaties tussen berichten, evenals de semantische gelijkenis tussen het hoofdbericht en zijn context, bestaande uit antwoorden, om state-of-the-art prestaties te verkrijgen. In dit werk tonen we aan dat semantische tegenstellingen de prestaties op de taak van geruchtdetectie kunnen verbeteren. We tonen aan dat semantische tegenstellingen elementen van onenigheid bevatten, die niet goed zijn gedekt door eerdere inspanningen, die alleen gebruik maken van semantische gelijkenis of antwoordstructuur. Met uitgebreide experimenten met recente datasets voor dit probleem laten we zien dat ons voorgestelde model state-of-the-art prestaties levert. Verder laten we zien dat ons model beter bestand is tegen de variaties in prestaties die door willekeurigheid worden geïntroduceerd.', 'da': 'Sociale netværk står over for en stor udfordring i form af rygter og fake news, på grund af deres iboende karakter af at forbinde brugere til millioner af andre, og at give enhver person magt til at skrive noget. I betragtning af den hurtige, udbredte udbredelse af oplysninger i sociale netværk er manuel detektering af mistænkelige nyheder suboptimal. Derfor er forskning i automatisk rygtedetektering blevet en nødvendighed. Tidligere værker på domænet har udnyttet svarrelationerne mellem indlæg, samt den semantiske lighed mellem hovedindlægget og dets kontekst, bestående af svar, for at opnå state-of-the-art performance. I dette arbejde demonstrerer vi, at semantisk modsætning kan forbedre ydeevnen på opgaven med rygtedetektion. Vi viser, at semantisk modsætning fanger elementer af uoverensstemmelse, som ikke er ordentligt dækket af tidligere bestræbelser, som kun udnytter semantisk lighed eller svarstruktur. Vi viser med omfattende eksperimenter med nyere datasæt til dette problem, at vores foreslåede model opnår state-of-the-art performance. Desuden viser vi, at vores model er mere modstandsdygtig over for de variationer i ydeevne, der indføres af tilfældighed.', 'hr': 'Društvene mreže suočavaju se sa velikim izazovom u obliku glasina i lažnih vijesti, zbog njihove unutrašnje prirode povezivanja korisnika sa milijunima drugih, i dajući svakom pojedincu moć postaviti bilo što. S obzirom na brzo, široko širenje informacija u društvenim mrežama, ručno otkrivanje sumnjivih vijesti je podoptimalno. Dakle, istraživanje o automatskom otkrivanju glasina postalo je potrebno. Prethodni radovi u domenu koristili su odgovorne odnose između postaja, kao i semantičku sličnost između glavnog posta i njegovog konteksta, u skladu s odgovorima, kako bi dobili postupak umjetnosti. U ovom poslu, pokazujemo da semantička suprotnost može poboljšati učinku na zadatku otkrivanja glasina. Pokazujemo da semantička suprotnost uhvati elemente diskriminacije, koje nisu propisno pokrivene prethodnim naporima, koji koriste samo semantičku sličnost ili strukturu odgovora. Mi pokazujemo, s velikim eksperimentima na nedavnim setima podataka za ovaj problem, da naš predloženi model postigne postignuće postignuće stanja umjetnosti. Nadalje, pokazujemo da je naš model otporniji na varijante učinka uvođene slučajnošću.', 'de': 'Soziale Netzwerke stehen vor einer großen Herausforderung in Form von Gerüchten und Fake News, aufgrund ihrer intrinsischen Natur, Benutzer mit Millionen von anderen zu verbinden und jeder Person die Möglichkeit zu geben, etwas zu posten. Angesichts der raschen, weit verbreiteten Verbreitung von Informationen in sozialen Netzwerken ist die manuelle Erkennung verdächtiger Nachrichten suboptimal. Daher ist Forschung zur automatischen Gerüchteerkennung zu einer Notwendigkeit geworden. Frühere Arbeiten in der Domäne haben die Antwortbeziehungen zwischen Beiträgen sowie die semantische Ähnlichkeit zwischen dem Hauptbeitrag und seinem Kontext, bestehend aus Antworten, genutzt, um State-of-the-Art Performance zu erhalten. In dieser Arbeit zeigen wir, dass semantische Gegensätze die Leistung bei der Aufgabe der Geruchserkennung verbessern können. Wir zeigen, dass semantische Gegensätze Elemente von Disharmonie erfassen, die von früheren Bemühungen nicht richtig abgedeckt werden, die nur semantische Ähnlichkeit oder Antwortstruktur verwenden. Mit umfangreichen Experimenten an aktuellen Datensätzen für dieses Problem zeigen wir, dass unser vorgeschlagenes Modell den neuesten Stand der Technik erreicht. Darüber hinaus zeigen wir, dass unser Modell widerstandsfähiger gegen die durch Zufall verursachten Leistungsunterschiede ist.', 'id': 'Jaringan sosial menghadapi tantangan besar dalam bentuk rumor dan berita palsu, karena sifat intrinsik mereka menghubungkan pengguna dengan jutaan orang lain, dan memberikan setiap individu kekuatan untuk memposting apapun. Mengingat penyebaran informasi yang cepat dan luas di jaringan sosial, secara manual mendeteksi berita yang mencurigakan adalah sub-optimal. Jadi, penelitian tentang deteksi rumor otomatis telah menjadi kebutuhan. Pekerjaan sebelumnya di domain telah menggunakan hubungan jawaban antara pos, dan persamaan semantis antara pos utama dan konteks, yang terdiri dari jawaban, untuk mendapatkan prestasi terbaik. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kita menunjukkan bahwa kebentangan semantis dapat meningkatkan prestasi dalam tugas deteksi rumor. Kami menunjukkan bahwa kebentangan semantis menangkap elemen ketidakperselisihan, yang tidak benar-benar ditutup oleh usaha sebelumnya, yang hanya menggunakan persamaan semantis atau struktur jawaban. Kami menunjukkan, dengan eksperimen ekstensif pada set data baru-baru ini untuk masalah ini, bahwa model kami diusulkan mencapai prestasi terbaik. Lagipula, kami menunjukkan bahwa model kami lebih resisten terhadap variasi dalam prestasi yang diperkenalkan oleh acak.', 'sw': 'Mitandao ya kijamii yanakabiliwa na changamoto kubwa katika namna ya uvumi na habari bandia, kwa sababu ya asili yao ya kuwaunganisha watumiaji mamilioni ya wengine, na kuwapa mtu yeyote uwezo wa kuweka chochote. Kutokana na kusambaza taarifa kwa kasi, kwa ujumla mkubwa katika mitandao ya kijamii, kutambua kwa manufaa habari zinazotia mashaka ni yenye matumaini. Kwa hiyo, utafiti wa uvumi wa kujitegemea umekuwa muhimu. Previous works in the domain have utilized the reply relations between posts, as well as the semantic similarity between the main post and its context, consisting of replies, in order to obtain state-of-the-art performance.  Katika kazi hii, tunaonyesha kuwa upinzani wa kimapenzi unaweza kuboresha ufanisi wa kazi ya kutambua uvumi. Tunaonyesha kuwa upinzani wa kimapenzi unachukua vipengele vya mgogoro, ambavyo havijulikana vizuri na jitihada zilizopita, ambazo tu hutumia miundombinu inayofanana na kimapenzi au kujibu. Tunaonyesha, kwa majaribio mengi kuhusu seti za takwimu za hivi karibuni kwa ajili ya tatizo hili, kwamba modeli yetu iliypendekezwa inafanikiwa na utendaji wa sanaa. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaonyesha kuwa muundo wetu una upinzani zaidi na tofauti katika utendaji uliofanywa na ukosefu.', 'ko': '소셜네트워크서비스(SNS)는 유언비어와 가짜 뉴스의 형식으로 중대한 도전에 직면해 있다. 왜냐하면 그들의 본질은 사용자를 수백만 명의 다른 사람과 연결시키고 그 누구에게도 어떤 것을 발표할 권리를 부여하는 것이다.소셜네트워크서비스(SNS)에서 정보의 신속하고 광범위한 전파를 감안하면 수상한 뉴스를 수동으로 검출하는 것이 최우선이다.따라서 헛소문에 대한 자동 검출 연구는 필연이 됐다.이 분야의 이전 작품은 게시물 간의 답장 관계와 주요 게시물과 그 상하문 간의 의미 유사성을 이용하여 답장을 포함하여 가장 선진적인 성능을 얻었다.이 작업에서 우리는 의미 대립이 루머 검출 임무의 성능을 향상시킬 수 있다는 것을 증명했다.우리는 의미 대립이 조화롭지 못한 요소를 포착했는데 이런 요소들은 이전 연구소에 덮이지 않고 의미의 유사성이나 회복 구조만 이용한다는 것을 발견했다.우리는 이 문제에 대한 최신 데이터 집합의 대량 실험을 통해 우리가 제시한 모델이 가장 선진적인 성능에 이르렀다는 것을 알 수 있다.또한 우리 모델은 랜덤성이 가져오는 성능 차이에 더욱 저항할 수 있다는 것을 보여준다.', 'fa': 'شبکه\u200cهای اجتماعی با یک چالش بزرگی در شکل شایعه\u200cها و خبرهای دروغ روبرو می\u200cشوند، به دلیل طبیعت داخلی آنها از ارتباط استفاده\u200cکنندگان با میلیون\u200cها دیگر، و به هر فردی قدرت دادن برای فرستادن هر چیزی. با توجه به گسترش سریع و گسترش اطلاعات در شبکه\u200cهای اجتماعی، اخبار مظنونی را دستگیر کردن دستی زیر optimal است. بنابراین، تحقیقات راجع به شناسایی شایعه\u200cهای خودکار نیازی شده است. کارهای قبلی در دامنه، رابطه\u200cهای جواب بین پست\u200cها و شبیه\u200cهای semantic بین پست اصلی و محیط\u200cاش استفاده کرده\u200cاند، consisting of replies, to obtain state-of-the-art performance. در این کار، ما نشان می دهیم که مخالفت semantic can improve the performance on the task of detection rumors. ما نشان می دهیم که برعکس سیمانتیک عناصر اختلاف را می گیرد، که به طور درست از تلاش قبلی پوشانده نمی شوند، که تنها شبیه سیمانتیک یا ساختار پاسخ را استفاده می کنند. ما نشان می دهیم، با آزمایشات بسیار زیادی در مجموعه داده های اخیر برای این مشکل، که مدل پیشنهاد ما به انجام وضعیت هنری رسیده است. بعلاوه، ما نشان می دهیم که مدل ما مقاومت بیشتری به تغییرات در عملکرد توسط تصادفی معرفی شده است.', 'sq': 'Rrjetet shoqërore ndeshen me një sfidë të madhe në form ën e thashethemeve dhe lajmeve të rreme, për shkak të natyrës së tyre të brendshme të lidhjes së përdoruesve me miliona të tjerë dhe të dhënies së çdo individ të pushtetit për të publikuar çdo gjë. Duke pasur parasysh shpërndarjen e shpejtë dhe të gjerë të informacionit në rrjetet sociale, zbulimi manual i lajmeve të dyshimtë është jo optimal. Kështu, kërkimi mbi zbulimin automatik të thashethemeve është bërë një nevojë. Punët e mëparshme në domeni kanë përdorur marrëdhëniet e përgjigjes midis postimeve si dhe ngjashmërinë semantike midis postit kryesor dhe kontekstit të tij, që përbëhet nga përgjigjet, me qëllim që të arrihet shfaqja më e lartë. Në këtë punë, ne demonstrojmë se kundërshtimi semantik mund të përmirësojë performancën në detyrën e zbulimit të thashethemeve. Ne tregojmë se kundërshtimi semantik kapon elemente të mospajtimit, të cilat nuk janë mbuluar siç duhet nga përpjekjet e mëparshme, të cilat përdorin vetëm ngjashmërinë semantike apo strukturën e përgjigjes. Ne tregojmë, me eksperimente të gjerë në grupet e të dhënave të fundit për këtë problem, se modeli ynë i propozuar arrin shfaqjen më të lartë. Më tej, ne tregojmë se modeli ynë është më rezistent ndaj varianteve në performancë të paraqitura nga rastësia.', 'tr': 'Sosial şebekeleriň a ýdym şeklinde örän uly kynçylyklary we ýalňyş haberler ýaly görünýärdi. Bu sebäpden ullançylaryň millilarlaryň başgalaryna baglanmaklaryny we her kim bir zat göndermek üçin güýçlerini bermek üçin ýüregi ýok. Çalt, döwletli maglumatlary sosial neteýlerde döwletlere görä, şübhelenýän täzelikleri elimden gözlemekdir. Şol sebäpli, awtomatik a ýdym alyp barlamasynyň gerekli bolup geçdi. Domaýdaky öňki işleri postlar arasyndaky jogaplary we esasy postlaryň arasyndaky semantik meňzeşliklerini ulandylar. Cevaplar içerisinde, möhüm-sanat eserlerini almak üçin. Bu işde semantik teňgalyklaryň diňe gürrüňler tanyşynyň işini gowurap biljekdigini görkeýäris. Biz öňki çabalar tarapyndan döwürilmedik, diňe semantik tebigatlaryň ýa-da jogaplaryň düzgünini ulanýandygyny görkeýäris. Ýakyndaky maglumat düzmelerinde örän köp deneylerimiz bilen bu mesele üçin, teklip eden nusganymyz möhüm taýýarlanmasy başarmady. Mundan soňra, nusgymyzyň çykyşlygynda görnüşler bilen tanyş edilen çykyşlyklara biraz kynçylykdyr diýip görkeýäris.', 'am': 'የውሸት እና የሐሰት ዜና መልክ ማኅበራዊ ጦማሪያዎች ለሚሊዮን የሚሆኑትን ተጠቃሚዎች እና ማንኛውንም ነገር ለመደገፍ የሚችሉትን ሥልጣን በመስጠት አቅኝቷል፡፡ ፈጥኖ፣ በማኅበራዊ መረብ ላይ መረጃዎችን በመስፋት በተሰፋው፣ በተጠራጠሩ ዜና እጃቸው ማግኘት የተሻለ ነው፡፡ Thus, research on automatic rumor detection has become a necessity.  የቀድሞው የዶሜን ሥራ በፖርቶች መካከል የመልስ ግንኙነት እና በዋነኛው ፖርቲካ እና በሥርዓቱ መካከል ምሳሌ በመጠቀም የመልስ ጥያቄዎችን ለመግኘት ጠቅሟል፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የsemantic ተቃውሞ የውሸትን አቀማመጥ ስራትን ለማሻል እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ ይህንን የተቃውሞ ተቃዋሚው የጥላቻን አካባቢዎች እናሳያቸዋለን፣ የቀድሞው ጉዳዮች በተለየ ጥያቄ ሳይደሰቱ፣ ይህም የsemantic ብጤት ወይም መልስ አካውንት ብቻ ይጠቅማል፡፡ በአሁኑ የዳታ ጥያቄዎች ላይ በተጨማሪው ፈተና እናሳየዋለን፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ ምሳሌያችን በንፍቅና በተገኘው የልዩ ልዩነት ላይ የሚቃወም መሆኑን እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'az': 'Sosyal şəbəkələr səslər və sahte xəbərlər kimi böyük çətinliklərlə qarşılaşırlar, milyonlarla başqa istifadəçiləri ilə birləşdirmək və hər birinə hər şeyi göndərmək üçün gücünü verirlər. Əslində şübhə edən xəbərləri çox gözəl görünür. Beləliklə, avtomatik səslər keşif barəsindəki araştırma tələb etdi. Domenin əvvəlki işləri postalar arasındakı cavab verən ilişkileri, həmçin in ana posta və onun məlumatı arasındakı semantik məlumatı istifadə etdilər, cavab vermək üçün sanat performansı olaraq. Bu işdə, semantik müqayisədə davranışların davranışlarını yaxşılaşdıra biləcəyini göstəririk. Biz göstəririk ki, semantik müqayisədə keçmişki çabalar ilə yaxınlaşmayan fərqli elementlərin əlamətlərini alır. Bu ancaq semantik similik və cavab quruluşunu istifadə edir. Biz bu problemin son məlumat qurularında böyük təcrübələrlə təcrübə etdiyimiz modellərin təcrübə göstərilir. Daha sonra, modellərimiz təhsil olaraq göstərilən varianzlərə daha müdafiə edir.', 'hy': 'Սոցիալական ցանցերը հանդիպում են խոսքերի և կեղծ նորությունների տեսքով գտնվող մեծ մարտահրավերի, քանի որ դրանք կապված են օգտագործողների հետ միլիոնավոր մարդկանց հետ և յուրաքանչյուր անհատի ուժը տալիս են հրապարակել ամեն ինչ: Եթե հաշվի առնենք տեղեկատվության արագ, տարածված տարածումը սոցիալական ցանցերում, կասկածելի նորությունների ձեռքով հայտնաբերումը ոչ-օպտիմալ է: Այսպիսով, ավտոմատիկ հնչյունների հայտնաբերման հետազոտությունները անհրաժեշտ են դառնում: Աշխարհում նախորդ աշխատանքները օգտագործել են պատասխանների հարաբերությունները դիրքերի միջև, ինչպես նաև սեմանտիկ նմանությունը հիմնական դիրքի և դրա կոնտեքստի միջև, որը կազմված է պատասխաններից, որպեսզի ստանանք ամենաբարձր արդյունքներ: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ սեմանտիկ հակադրությունը կարող է բարելավել լսումների հայտնաբերման խնդիրը: We show that semantic oppositeness captures elements of discord, which are not properly covered by previous efforts, which only utilize semantic similarity or reply structure.  Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, այս խնդրի վերջին տվյալների համակարգերի մեծ փորձարկումների արդյունքում, որ մեր առաջարկած մոդելը հասնում է ամենաբարձր արդյունքների: Ավելին, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը ավելի դիմադրելի է պատահականությամբ ներկայացված արտադրողության տարբերություններին:', 'af': "Soziale netwerke kyk met 'n groot uitdrukking in die vorm van rumore en falske nuus, vanweë hulle intrinsiese natuur van verbinding van gebruikers met miljoene van ander, en om enige individuele die mag te gee om enigiets te stuur. Omdat die vinnige, verspreidige verspreiding van inligting in sosiale netwerke gegee het, is die onderspreidige nuus onder-optimal besluit. Daarom het deursoek oor outomatiese rumor opdekking 'n nodigheid geword. Vorige werke in die domein het die antwoord verhouding tussen pos gebruik, asook die semantiese gelykenis tussen die hoofpos en sy konteks, wat bestaan van antwoorde, om staat-van-kuns-prestasie te kry. In hierdie werk, ons wys dat semantiese teenstandigheid die prestasie op die taak van rumor opdekking kan verbeter. Ons wys dat semantiese teenstandigheid opneem elemente van diskord, wat nie reg oordek word deur vorige versoekte nie, wat slegs semantiese gelykheid of antwoord struktuur gebruik word nie. Ons wys, met uitbreidige eksperimente op onlangse data stelle vir hierdie probleem, dat ons voorgestelde model bereik staat-van-kuns-prestasie. Verder, ons wys dat ons model meer resistant is aan die varianse in prestasie wat deur willekeurigheid aangedoen is.", 'bn': 'সামাজিক নেটওয়ার্ক গুজব এবং মিথ্যা সংবাদের মুখোমুখি হয়েছে, তাদের অভ্যন্তরীণ প্রকৃতির কারণে তাদের কোটি লক্ষ লক্ষ ব্যবহারকারীদের সাথে যোগ সামাজিক যোগাযোগ নেটওয়ার্কে তথ্য প্রচারের দ্রুত, বিস্তৃত তথ্য প্রচার করার ক্ষেত্রে সন্দেহের সংবাদ নিয়ে সন্দেহ তাই স্বয়ংক্রিয় গুজব সন্ধানের গবেষণা প্রয়োজন হয়ে গেছে। ডোমেইনের পূর্ববর্তী কাজ পোস্টের মধ্যে সাড়া সম্পর্ক ব্যবহার করেছে, আর প্রধান পোস্ট এবং এর প্রেক্ষেত্রের মধ্যে সেমান্টিক সমাধান ব্যবহার করেছে, যার ফলে প্রত এই কাজে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে সেমেন্টিক বিরোধী বিরোধীতা গুজব সন্ধানের কাজের কাজের কাজ উন্নত করতে পারে। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে সেমেন্টিক বিরোধী বিরোধীদলীয় বিভ্রান্তির উপাদান তুলে ধরে, যা আগের প্রচেষ্টার মাধ্যমে সঠিকভাবে কাভার করে না, য আমরা এই সমস্যার জন্য সাম্প্রতিক তথ্য সেট সম্পর্কে বিস্তারিত পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেলের রাষ্ট্র-শি এছাড়াও, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের মডেলের প্রতিরোধীতার চেয়ে বেশী প্রতিরোধী হয়েছে যেখানে তারা নির্দিষ্ট প্', 'ca': "Les xarxes socials enfronten un gran repte en form a de rumors i notícies falses, degut a la seva naturalesa intrínseca de connectar els usuaris amb milions d'altres, i de donar a qualsevol individu el poder de publicar qualsevol cosa. Given the rapid, widespread dissemination of information in social networks, manually detecting suspicious news is sub-optimal.  Thus, research on automatic rumor detection has become a necessity.  Els treballs anteriors en el domini han utilitzat les relacions de resposta entre els posts, així com la similitud semàntica entre el post principal i el seu context, que consisteix en respostes, per aconseguir una actuació més avançada. En aquest treball, demostrem que la oposició semàntica pot millorar el rendiment de la tasca de detecció de rumors. Mostrem que l'oposició semàntica captura elements de discorde, que no estan coberts adequadament pels esforços anteriors, que només utilitzen la similitud semàntica o l'estructura de resposta. Ens mostram, amb extensos experiments en conjunts de dades recents per aquest problema, que el nostre model proposat aconsegueix un rendiment més avançat. També demostram que el nostre model és més resistent a les variacions de rendiment introduïdes per l'aleatorietat.", 'cs': 'Sociální sítě čelí velké výzvě v podobě fámů a falešných zpráv, vzhledem k jejich vnitřní povaze spojovat uživatele s miliony dalších a dávat každému jednotlivci možnost cokoliv zveřejňovat. Vzhledem k rychlému a širokému šíření informací v sociálních sítích je ruční detekce podezřelých zpráv suboptimální. Proto se výzkum automatické detekce drbů stal nutností. Předchozí práce v této oblasti využívaly vztahy odpovědí mezi příspěvky, stejně jako sémantickou podobnost mezi hlavním příspěvkem a jeho kontextem, skládajícím se z odpovědí, aby bylo dosaženo nejmodernějšího výkonu. V této práci demonstrujeme, že sémantická opačnost může zlepšit výkon při detekci drbů. Ukazujeme, že sémantická opačnost zachycuje prvky neshody, které nejsou řádně pokryty předchozími snahami, které využívají pouze sémantické podobnosti nebo struktury odpovědi. Pomocí rozsáhlých experimentů na nedávných datových sadách pro tento problém ukazujeme, že náš navržený model dosahuje nejmodernějšího výkonu. Dále ukazujeme, že náš model je odolnější vůči rozdílům ve výkonu, které přináší náhoda.', 'et': 'Sotsiaalvõrgustikud seisavad silmitsi suure väljakutsega kuulujuttude ja valeuudiste kujul, kuna nende olemuslik olemus on ühendada kasutajad miljonite teistega ja anda igale üksikisikule õigus midagi postitada. Arvestades teabe kiiret ja laialdast levitamist sotsiaalvõrgustikes, ei ole kahtlaste uudiste käsitsi tuvastamine optimaalne. Seega on automaatse kuulujuttude tuvastamise uurimine muutunud vajalikuks. Eelmised tööd valdkonnas on kasutanud postitustevahelisi vastussuhteid, samuti semantilist sarnasust peapostituse ja selle vastustest koosneva konteksti vahel, et saada kaasaegset etendust. Käesolevas töös näitame, et semantiline vastandlus võib parandada kuulujutte avastamise tulemuslikkust. Näitame, et semantiline vastandlus tabab lahkarvamuse elemente, mida varasemad jõupingutused ei kajasta korralikult, mis kasutavad ainult semantilist sarnasust või vastuse struktuuri. Näitame laiaulatuslike eksperimentidega hiljutiste andmekogumitega selle probleemi jaoks, et meie pakutud mudel saavutab tipptasemel jõudluse. Lisaks näitame, et meie mudel on vastupidavam juhuslikkusest tingitud jõudluse erinevustele.', 'bs': 'Socijalne mreže suočavaju se sa velikim izazovom u obliku glasina i lažnih vijesti, zbog njihove unutrašnje prirode povezivanja korisnika sa milijunima drugih, i dati svakom pojedincu moć da postavi bilo šta. S obzirom na brzo, široko širenje informacija u društvenim mrežama, ručno otkrivanje sumnjivih vijesti je podoptimalno. Dakle, istraživanje o automatskom otkrivanju glasina postalo je potrebno. Prethodni radovi u domenu koristili su odgovorne odnose između postaja, kao i semantičku sličnost između glavnog posta i njegovog konteksta, u skladu sa odgovorima, kako bi dobili postupne funkcije. U ovom poslu, pokazujemo da semantička opozicija može poboljšati izvršnost zadatka otkrivanja glasina. Pokazujemo da semantička suprotnost uhvati elemente diskriminacije, koje nisu propisno pokrivene prethodnim naporima, koji koriste samo semantičku sličnost ili strukturu odgovora. Mi pokazujemo, sa velikim eksperimentima na nedavnim setima podataka za ovaj problem, da naš predloženi model postigne postignuće postignuće stanja umjetnosti. Nadalje, pokazujemo da je naš model otporniji na varijante u izvedbi predstavljene slucajnošću.', 'fi': 'Sosiaaliset verkostot kohtaavat suuren haasteen huhujen ja valeuutisten muodossa, koska niiden luontainen luonne yhdistää käyttäjät miljooniin muihin ja antaa jokaiselle yksilölle valta julkaista mitä tahansa. Koska tietoja levitetään nopeasti ja laajalti sosiaalisissa verkostoissa, epäilyttävien uutisten manuaalinen havaitseminen ei ole optimaalista. Näin ollen automaattisen huhujen havaitsemisen tutkimus on tullut välttämättömäksi. Aiemmat alan teokset ovat hyödyntäneet viestien välisiä vastaussuhteita sekä pääkirjoituksen ja sen vastauksista koostuvan kontekstin semanttista samankaltaisuutta saadakseen huipputason performanssin. Tässä työssä osoitetaan, että semanttinen vastakkainasettelu voi parantaa huhujen havaitsemisen suorituskykyä. Osoitamme, että semanttinen vastakohta vangitsee erimielisyyden elementtejä, joita aikaisemmat ponnistelut eivät oikein kata, vaan ne hyödyntävät vain semanttista samankaltaisuutta tai vastausrakennetta. Osoitamme laajojen kokeilujen avulla, että ehdotettu malli saavuttaa huipputason suorituskyvyn. Lisäksi osoitamme, että mallimme on kestävämpi satunnaisuuden aiheuttamille suorituskyvyn vaihteluille.', 'ha': "Shawarar jamii sun haɗa wani mai muhimmi cikin tsarin rumors da news na ƙarya, saboda da mazaunin da ke haɗa masu amfani da millions wanin mutane, kuma a ga kowane rai wani ƙarfin ya poste wani abu. Given the rapid, widespread dissemination of information in social networks, manually detecting suspicious news is sub-optimal.  Kayya, karatun kan ganin zura farat ɗaya ya kasance na lazima. Yi amfani da aikin da ya gabãta a cikin wannan Domen sun yi amfani da tsari masu amfani da matsayi tsakanin posten, da kuma masu daidaita tsakanin kwanan da mazaɓa, masu haɗi da jibo, dõmin ya sami tsarin-mai-art. Daga wannan aikin, tuna nuna cewa, kangara na tsakanin semantiki yana iya ƙara mafarin aikin da za'a gane wani na'ura. Tuna nũna cewa masu motsi na semantic ke kãma elements of strife, waɗanda ba su riga da aikin da suka gabãta ba, wanda ke yi amfani da semantin daidaita ko kuma masu jibo. Tuna nũna, da jarrabi masu yawa a kan tsarin data na yanzu wa wannan shida, in da aka buƙata misalinmu ya sami tsarin-da-sanar. Furan, Munã nũna misalinmu yana ƙaranci motsi zuwa ga gaura da aka fara da ranar da ba.", 'sk': 'Socialna omrežja se soočajo z velikim izzivom v obliki govoric in lažnih novic, zaradi njihove notranje narave povezovanja uporabnikov z milijoni drugimi in dajanja moči vsakemu posamezniku, da objavi karkoli. Glede na hitro in razširjeno širjenje informacij v socialnih omrežjih je ročno odkrivanje sumljivih novic neoptimalno. Tako je raziskava o avtomatskem odkrivanju govoric postala nujna. Prejšnja dela na področju so uporabila odgovorne relacije med objavami ter semantično podobnost med glavno objavo in njenim kontekstom, sestavljenim iz odgovorov, da bi dosegla najsodobnejšo predstavo. V tem delu dokazujemo, da semantično nasprotje lahko izboljša učinkovitost pri nalogi odkrivanja govoric. Pokazujemo, da semantično nasprotje zajema elemente nesoglasja, ki jih prejšnja prizadevanja niso ustrezno pokrita, ki uporabljajo le semantično podobnost ali strukturo odgovorov. Z obsežnimi eksperimenti na najnovejših naborih podatkov za to težavo pokažemo, da naš predlagani model dosega najsodobnejšo zmogljivost. Poleg tega pokažemo, da je naš model bolj odporen na razlike v zmogljivosti, ki jih uvaja naključnost.', 'jv': 'tambah sarah-sarah sing nganggep akèh dumadhi kanggo awak dhéwé mengko awak dhéwé lan alam kuwi mau, mengko awak dhéwé kuwi kesempatan kanggo awak dhéwé sampeyan kanggo awak dhéwé. Daerah mbukaké awak dhéwé Genjer-genjer langkung wigatik, langkung rawuh akeh informasi ning tambah sarah sakjane politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Awak dhéwé karo ning domain kuwi nggawe barang nggambar cara-cara ngono semanti cara-cara nggawe punika ingkang punika lan kontèks wong, iso nggambar responte, nggawe oleh jutaan cara-cara nggawe. Nang iné, kéné pisan ngerti sematik oposituran iso nggawe nggawe gerakan kanggo nguasai paten kanggo langgar rumor. Awak dhéwé éntukno karo sematik perusahaan kelompok nggawe gerakan karo kalem rasané, sing bisa pasakno ngono nggawe barang sematik perusahaan sematik karo nggantawakno Awak dhéwé, ngéwé éntuk sistem sing gak dhéwé, ngono hal-hal ngono perusahaan data sing nggawe perusahaan iki, nik awak dhéwé nambah model sing bisa perusahaan langgar tarjamah-perusahaan Lakok, kita ngomongke modellu kuwi nggantong sing luwih karo perusahaan bangsane', 'he': 'רשתות חברתיות מתמודדות עם אתגר גדול בצורה של שמועות וחדשות מזויפות, בגלל הטבע הפנימי שלהם של חיבור משתמשים למיליוני אחרים, ולתת לכל אדם את הכוח לפרסם הכל. Given the rapid, widespread dissemination of information in social networks, manually detecting suspicious news is sub-optimal.  כך, מחקר על גילוי שמועות אוטומטי הפך לצורך. העבודות הקודמות בתחום השתמשו בין יחסי תשובה בין משימות, כמו גם בדומה סמנטית בין המשימה העיקרית לקשר שלה, מורכבת משיבות, כדי להשיג ביצועים חדשים. בעבודה הזו, אנחנו מראים שההתנגדות סמנטית יכולה לשפר את ההופעה על משימה של גילוי שמועות. אנו מראים שההתנגדות סמנטית מכילה אלמנטים של התנגדות, שלא מכוסים כראוי במאמצים קודמים, אשר משתמשים רק בדמיון סמנטי או מבנה תשובה. אנחנו מראים, עם ניסויים רחבים על קבוצות נתונים לאחרונה לבעיה הזאת, שהמודל המוצע שלנו משיג ביצועים חדשים. חוץ מזה, אנחנו מראים שהדוגמנית שלנו יותר מתנגדת לשינויים ביצועים שהופיעו על ידי אקראיות.', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ་དེ་གསར་གཏོད་དང་བློ་གཏད་བརྙན་འགྱུར་བ་ལ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་གདོང་ལེན་ཡོད། མགྱོག་མྱུར་བའི་དྲ་ཐོག་ཏུ་ཆ་འཕྲིན དེར་བརྟེན། རང་འགུལ་གྱི་དཀྲོག་གཏོང་བཤད་ཀྱི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ནི་དགོས་པ་ཞིག་ཆགས་ཡོད། དྲ་ཐོག་གི་སྔོན་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་དག་གིས་གནས་ཡུལ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་རྩ་བའི་གནས་ཡུལ་དང་ཁོངས་ཡུལ་གྱི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་དང་མཐུན་སྣང་བེད་སྤྱོད་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་པའི་ལྡོག་ཕྱོགས་སྣང་ཚོར་བཤད་ཀྱི་བྱ་སྟངས་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་པའི་ལྡོག་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཚོར་བཀོད་པའམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ནང་དུ་ཕལ་མེད་པའི་སྐྱེས་ཚུལ་ལྟར་བ་དང་བསྒྲུབ་བཟོ་ ང་ཚོས་དཀའ་ངལ་ཆེན་ཡོད་པའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱས་པར་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན་ན། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་མིག་སྔར་སྒྲིག་འདྲ་བ་གཉིས་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བྱས་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Polarized-VAE : Proximity Based Disentangled Representation Learning for Text Generation', 'ar': 'Polarized-VAE: تعلم التمثيل القائم على التقارب لتوليد النص', 'fr': 'VAE polarisé\xa0: apprentissage des représentations démêlées basé sur la proximité pour la génération de texte', 'es': 'Polarized-VAE: Aprendizaje de representación desenredada basado en proximidad para la generación de texto', 'pt': 'Polarized-VAE: Aprendizagem de representação desembaraçada baseada em proximidade para geração de texto', 'ja': 'Polarized - VAE ：テキスト生成のための近接ベースの非連結表現学習', 'hi': 'Polarized-VAE: निकटता आधारित Disentangled प्रतिनिधित्व पाठ पीढ़ी के लिए सीखना', 'zh': '偏振 VAE:近解缠,文本成也', 'ru': 'Polarized-VAE: Бесконтактное разрозненное представление обучения для генерации текста', 'ga': 'Polarized-VAE: Foghlaim Léiriúcháin Dhídheangailte Bunaithe ar Chóngaracht do Ghiniúint Téacs', 'ka': 'პოლარიზებული- VAE: პირობით დაბაზებული განსხვავებული განსხვავება ტექსტის შექმნა', 'el': 'Πολικός-ΒΑΕ: Μάθηση Διασυνδεδεμένης Αντιπροσωπείας με βάση την εγγύτητα για τη δημιουργία κειμένου', 'hu': 'Polarized-VAE: Közelség alapú zavaros reprezentációs tanulás a szöveggeneráláshoz', 'it': 'Polarized-VAE: apprendimento di rappresentazione disimpigliata basato sulla prossimità per la generazione di testo', 'lt': 'Polarizuotas VAE: artimumu pagrįstas nenutrūkstamo atstovavimo mokymasis teksto generacijai', 'kk': 'Поларизирован- VAE: Мәтін құру үшін жақын негіздеген таңбалау', 'mk': 'Polarized-VAE: Proximity Based Disentangled Representation Learning for Text Generation', 'ms': 'VAE-Polarized: Perwakilan Berasas Kedekatan Disentangled Learning for Text Generation', 'ml': 'പദാവലി- വിഎം: പദാവലി ജനിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രോക്സിമിറ്റി അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ പ്രതിനിധി പഠിക്കുന്', 'mt': 'VAE polarizzat: Tagħlim ta’ Rappreżentanza Disentanglata bbażata fuq il-Prossimità għall-Ġenerazzjoni tat-Test', 'mn': 'Polarized-VAE: Approximate Based Disentangled Representation Learning for Text Generation', 'pl': 'Polarized-VAE: Uczenie się reprezentacji oparte na zbliżeniu do generowania tekstu', 'ro': 'Polarized-VAE: Învățarea reprezentării dezimplicate bazate pe proximitate pentru generarea de text', 'sr': 'Polarizirano-VAE: Naučenje za generaciju teksta na temelju približnosti', 'no': 'Polarisert- VAE: Nærmeste basert disntangled Representative Learning for Text Generation', 'so': 'Polarized-VAE: Proximity Based Disabled Representation Learning for Text Generation', 'sv': 'Polariserad VAE: Närhetsbaserad Disentangled Representation Learning för textgenerering', 'si': 'පෝලායිස් විස්තාරයක්: පාළ ප්\u200dරසිද්ධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරසිද්ධ විස්තාරයක් පිළිගන්න', 'ta': 'Polarized- VAE: Text Generation', 'ur': 'Polarized-VAE: تقریباً بنیاد ڈیزانگلڈ ریسپانسیٹ سیکھنے', 'uz': 'Polarized-VAE: Proximity Based Disentangled Representation Learning for Text Generation', 'vi': 'Học về văn bản theo cách gấp gáp', 'da': 'Polarized-VAE: Nærhedsbaseret Disentangled Representation Learning for Text Generation', 'hr': 'Polarizirano-VAE: Naučenje za generaciju teksta na temelju približnosti', 'de': 'Polarized-VAE: Proximity Based Distangled Representation Learning für die Textgenerierung', 'id': 'Polarized-VAE: Kedekatan Berdasarkan Perwakilan Diganggu Belajar untuk Generasi Teks', 'ko': '극화VAE: 텍스트 생성에서 근접도를 바탕으로 하는 비교착 표시 학습', 'nl': 'Polarized-VAE: Proximity Based Distangled Representation Learning voor tekstgeneratie', 'bg': 'Поляризирано-VAE: Обучение на отдалечено представяне на базата на близостта за генериране на текст', 'sw': 'VAE-Uchaguzi wa VAE: Kutokana na Umoja wa Kuzungumzia Kujifunza kwa ajili ya Uzalishaji wa Maandishi', 'sq': 'Polirizuar-VAE: Përfaqësues i zhvendosur bazuar në afërsi Mësimi për Gjenerimin e Tekstit', 'fa': 'پلوریزید-VAE: آموزش آموزش نماینده\u200cهای ناپدید شده برای تولید متن', 'tr': 'Polarized-VAE', 'af': 'Polariseer- VAE: Proximity Based Disentangled Representation Learning for Text Generation', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Պոլարիզացված-ՎԱԵ. Միջնության հիմնված զարգացված ներկայացուցիչ սովորելը տեքստի ստեղծման համար', 'az': 'Polarized-VAE: YaxńĪnlńĪq Temel T…ôr…ôfl…ônmiŇü T…ôr…ôfl…ônm…ô √Ėyr…ônm…ôsi', 'bn': 'পোলারিয়েশন- ভিয়া: টেক্সট জেনারেশনের জন্য প্রক্রিয়া ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক প্রতিনিধিত্ব বিচ্ছিন্ন', 'bs': 'Polarizirano-VAE: Naučenje za generaciju teksta na temelju približnosti', 'ca': 'ENV polaritzat: Aprendència de representació desentanglada basada en la proximitat per a la generació de text', 'cs': 'Polarized-VAE: Výuka vzdálené reprezentace založená na blízkosti pro generování textu', 'et': 'Polarised-VAE: läheduspõhine distantsled representation Learning for Text Generation', 'fi': 'Polarized-VAE: Proximity Based Distangled Representation Learning for Text Generation', 'jv': 'polalised-VE: Proksity basa Disantagled representation Learning for Text Generation', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'sk': 'Polarized-VAE: učenje oddaljene predstavitve na podlagi bližine za ustvarjanje besedila', 'he': 'VAE פולאריזציה: מייצגה מבוססת קרובות ללמוד ליצירת טקסט', 'bo': 'Polarized-VAE: Approximate Based Disentangled Representation Learning for Text Generation'}
{'en': 'Learning disentangled representations of realworld data is a challenging open problem. Most previous methods have focused on either supervised approaches which use attribute labels or unsupervised approaches that manipulate the factorization in the latent space of models such as the variational autoencoder (VAE) by training with task-specific losses. In this work, we propose polarized-VAE, an approach that disentangles select attributes in the latent space based on proximity measures reflecting the similarity between data points with respect to these attributes. We apply our method to disentangle the semantics and syntax of sentences and carry out transfer experiments. Polarized-VAE outperforms the VAE baseline and is competitive with state-of-the-art approaches, while being more a general framework that is applicable to other attribute disentanglement tasks.', 'ar': 'يعد تعلم التمثيلات غير المتشابكة لبيانات العالم الحقيقي مشكلة مفتوحة صعبة. ركزت معظم الطرق السابقة على الأساليب الخاضعة للإشراف التي تستخدم تسميات السمات أو الأساليب غير الخاضعة للإشراف التي تتعامل مع العوامل في المساحة الكامنة للنماذج مثل المشفر التلقائي المتغير (VAE) من خلال التدريب مع الخسائر الخاصة بالمهمة. في هذا العمل ، نقترح الاستقطاب- VAE ، وهو نهج يفكك تشابك السمات المختارة في الفضاء الكامن بناءً على مقاييس القرب التي تعكس التشابه بين نقاط البيانات فيما يتعلق بهذه السمات. نطبق طريقتنا لفك تشابك دلالات الجمل ونحوها وإجراء تجارب النقل. يتفوق Polarized-VAE في الأداء على خط الأساس VAE وهو قادر على المنافسة مع أحدث الأساليب ، بينما يكون إطارًا عامًا أكثر قابلية للتطبيق على مهام فك تشابك السمات الأخرى.', 'fr': "L'apprentissage de représentations démêlées de données du monde réel est un problème ouvert difficile. La plupart des méthodes précédentes se sont concentrées soit sur des approches supervisées qui utilisent des étiquettes d'attributs, soit sur des approches non supervisées qui manipulent la factorisation dans l'espace latent de modèles tels que l'autoencodeur variationnel (VAE) en s'entraînant avec des pertes spécifiques à une tâche. Dans ce travail, nous proposons un VAE polarisé, une approche qui démêle certains attributs dans l'espace latent en fonction de mesures de proximité reflétant la similitude entre des points de données par rapport à ces attributs. Nous appliquons notre méthode pour démêler la sémantique et la syntaxe des phrases et réaliser des expériences de transfert. La VAE polarisée surpasse la base VAE et est compétitive avec les approches de pointe, tout en étant plutôt un cadre général applicable à d'autres tâches de démêlage d'attributs.", 'es': 'Aprender representaciones desenredadas de datos del mundo real es un problema abierto y desafiante. La mayoría de los métodos anteriores se han centrado en enfoques supervisados que utilizan etiquetas de atributos o enfoques no supervisados que manipulan la factorización en el espacio latente de modelos como el autocodificador variacional (VAE) mediante el entrenamiento con pérdidas específicas de la tarea. En este trabajo, proponemos VAE polarizada, un enfoque que desenreda atributos seleccionados en el espacio latente en función de medidas de proximidad que reflejan la similitud entre puntos de datos con respecto a estos atributos. Aplicamos nuestro método para desenredar la semántica y la sintaxis de las oraciones y realizamos experimentos de transferencia. La VAE polarizada supera a la línea base de VAE y es competitiva con los enfoques más avanzados, al tiempo que es más un marco general que se aplica a otras tareas de desenredo de atributos.', 'pt': 'Aprender representações desembaraçadas de dados do mundo real é um problema aberto desafiador. A maioria dos métodos anteriores se concentrou em abordagens supervisionadas que usam rótulos de atributos ou abordagens não supervisionadas que manipulam a fatoração no espaço latente de modelos como o autoencoder variacional (VAE) treinando com perdas específicas da tarefa. Neste trabalho, propomos o VAE polarizado, uma abordagem que separa atributos selecionados no espaço latente com base em medidas de proximidade que refletem a similaridade entre pontos de dados em relação a esses atributos. Aplicamos nosso método para desembaraçar a semântica e a sintaxe das frases e realizamos experimentos de transferência. O Polarized-VAE supera a linha de base do VAE e é competitivo com abordagens de última geração, sendo mais uma estrutura geral aplicável a outras tarefas de separação de atributos.', 'ja': '現実世界のデータの分離された表現を学習することは、困難なオープンな問題です。ほとんどの以前の方法は、属性ラベルを使用する監視されたアプローチ、またはタスク固有の損失を伴うトレーニングによってバリエーションオートエンコーダ（ VAE ）などのモデルの潜在的な空間における因数分解を操作する監視されていないアプローチのいずれかに焦点を当てています。本研究では、データ点間の類似性を反映した近接測定に基づいて潜伏空間内の選択された属性を切り離す偏光- VAEアプローチを提案する。文の意味論や構文を切り離し、転送実験を行う方法を応用しています。偏光VAEは、VAEベースラインを上回り、最先端のアプローチと競合しますが、他の属性解離タスクに適用可能なより一般的なフレームワークです。', 'ru': 'Изучение разрозненных представлений данных реального мира является сложной открытой проблемой. Большинство предыдущих методов были сосредоточены либо на контролируемых подходах, которые используют метки атрибутов, либо на неконтролируемых подходах, которые манипулируют факторизацией в скрытом пространстве моделей, таких как вариационный автокодер (VAE), обучая с конкретными потерями задач. В этой работе мы предлагаем поляризованное-VAE, подход, который распутал выбранные атрибуты в латентном пространстве на основе измерений близости, отражающих сходство между точками данных в отношении этих атрибутов. Применяем наш метод для распутания семантики и синтаксиса предложений и проводим трансферные эксперименты. Поляризованное VAE превосходит базовую линию VAE и конкурирует с современными подходами, одновременно являясь более общей структурой, которая применима к другим задачам распутывания атрибутов.', 'hi': 'Realworld डेटा के disentangled अभ्यावेदन सीखना एक चुनौतीपूर्ण खुली समस्या है। अधिकांश पिछले तरीकों ने या तो पर्यवेक्षित दृष्टिकोणों पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया है जो विशेषता लेबल या असुरक्षित दृष्टिकोणों का उपयोग करते हैं जो कार्य-विशिष्ट नुकसान के साथ प्रशिक्षण द्वारा भिन्नतात्मक ऑटोएनकोडर (वीएई) जैसे मॉडल के अव्यक्त स्थान में फैक्टराइजेशन में हेरफेर करते हैं। इस काम में, हम ध्रुवीकृत-वीएई का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, एक दृष्टिकोण जो इन विशेषताओं के संबंध में डेटा बिंदुओं के बीच समानता को दर्शाते हुए निकटता उपायों के आधार पर अव्यक्त स्थान में विशेषताओं का चयन करता है। हम वाक्यों के शब्दार्थ और वाक्यविन्यास को अलग करने और हस्तांतरण प्रयोगों को पूरा करने के लिए अपनी विधि लागू करते हैं। Polarized-VAE VAE बेसलाइन को मात देता है और अत्याधुनिक दृष्टिकोणों के साथ प्रतिस्पर्धी है, जबकि अधिक एक सामान्य रूपरेखा है जो अन्य विशेषता विघटन कार्यों पर लागू होती है।', 'zh': '学世数者解缠示有挑战性也。 前此多侧重于监督之法,或无监督之法,所以练特定于职事之损,以操形于空间者,变分自编码器(VAE)也。 于此言之,极化VAE者,近度以解潜选之法,数相似性之数也。 宜以吾法解句语义语法,移而实验之。 Polarized-VAE优于VAE基线,与先进之法有竞争力,又犹一用于性解缠之通用框架。', 'ga': 'Is fadhb oscailte dhúshlánach í foghlaim léirithe dícheangailte de shonraí an fhíorshaoil. Dhírigh an chuid is mó de na modhanna roimhe seo ar cheachtar cur chuige maoirsithe a úsáideann lipéid tréithe nó cineálacha cur chuige neamh-mhaoirsithe a ionramhálann an fachtóiriú i spás folaigh samhlacha mar an t-uath-ionchódóir athraitheach (VAE) trí oiliúint a dhéanamh le caillteanais tasc-shonracha. San obair seo, molaimid polaraithe-VAE, cur chuige a dhíscaoileann tréithe roghnaithe sa spás folaigh bunaithe ar bhearta gaireachta a léiríonn an chosúlacht idir pointí sonraí maidir leis na tréithe seo. Cuirimid ár modh i bhfeidhm chun séimeantaic agus comhréir abairtí a dhícheangal agus déanann muid turgnaimh aistrithe. Sáraíonn Polarized-VAE an bonnlíne VAE agus tá sé iomaíoch le cineálacha cur chuige úrscothacha, agus é ina chreat níos ginearálta atá infheidhme maidir le tascanna eile um dhícheangal tréithe.', 'ka': 'მსოფლიოს მონაცემების განსაკუთრებული გამოსახულებების შესწავლობა არის გასაკუთრებელი პრობლემა. უფრო მეტი წინასწარმოდგენებული მეტოვების შესახებ, რომლებიც ატრიბუტების etiqueტების გამოყენება ან არსპერვისპერვისტირებული მეტოვების გამოყენება, რომლებიც მოდელების მუშაობაში ფაქტორიზაციას, როგორც გარიანციოლურ ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ პოლარიზებული-VAE-ს, პროგრამა, რომელიც გადაწყენებს ატრიბუტების არჩეულებას, რომელიც ატრიბუტების წინაწყენებაში დავწყენებს წინაწყენებული მონაცემების წინ ჩვენ ჩვენი მეთოდის გამოყენება სიმენტიკის და სინტაქქსის გარეშე და გარეშე ექსპერიმენტები. ოჲლაპთჱთპან-VAE უფრო ნაეკლძფებს VAE-ს ბაზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზ', 'el': 'Η εκμάθηση ανεξάρτητων αναπαραστάσεων δεδομένων του πραγματικού κόσμου είναι ένα προκλητικό ανοικτό πρόβλημα. Οι περισσότερες προηγούμενες μέθοδοι έχουν επικεντρωθεί είτε σε εποπτευμένες προσεγγίσεις που χρησιμοποιούν ετικέτες χαρακτηριστικών είτε σε μη επιτηρημένες προσεγγίσεις που χειραγωγούν τον παράγοντα στον λανθάνοντα χώρο μοντέλων όπως ο μεταβλητός αυτόματος κωδικοποιητής (VAE) εκπαιδεύοντας με απώλειες συγκεκριμένων εργασιών. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε πολωμένη προσέγγιση που διαχωρίζει επιλεγμένα χαρακτηριστικά στον λανθάνοντα χώρο με βάση μέτρα εγγύτητας που αντικατοπτρίζουν την ομοιότητα μεταξύ των σημείων δεδομένων σε σχέση με αυτά τα χαρακτηριστικά. Εφαρμόζουμε τη μέθοδο μας για να ξεμπερδέψουμε τη σημασιολογία και τη σύνταξη των προτάσεων και να πραγματοποιήσουμε πειράματα μεταφοράς. Το πολωμένο VAE ξεπερνά τη γραμμή βάσης VAE και είναι ανταγωνιστικό με τις πιο σύγχρονες προσεγγίσεις, ενώ είναι περισσότερο ένα γενικό πλαίσιο που εφαρμόζεται σε άλλες εργασίες αποσύνδεσης χαρακτηριστικών.', 'hu': 'A valós világ adatainak összekapcsolatlan reprezentációinak tanulása kihívást jelentő nyitott probléma. A legtöbb korábbi módszer vagy felügyelt megközelítésekre összpontosított, amelyek attribútumcímkéket használnak, vagy felügyelet nélküli megközelítésekre, amelyek manipulálják a faktorizációt a látens térben olyan modellek, mint a variációs autoencoder (VAE) feladatspecifikus veszteségek betanításával. Ebben a munkában javasoljuk a polarizált VAE-t, egy olyan megközelítést, amely a látens térben található kiválasztott attribútumokat a közelségi mérések alapján bontja ki, amelyek tükrözik az adatpontok hasonlóságát ezekkel az attribútumokkal kapcsolatban. Módszerünket alkalmazzuk a mondatok szemantikájának és szintaxisának kibontására és transzferkísérletekre. A polarizált VAE felülmúlja a VAE alapját, és versenyképes a legkorszerűbb megközelítésekkel, miközben inkább egy általános keretrendszer, amely alkalmazható más attribútumkiosztási feladatokra.', 'mk': 'Учењето на отстранетите претставувања на податоците од реалниот свет е предизвикувачки отворен проблем. Повеќето претходни методи се фокусираа или на надгледувани пристапи кои користат етикети на атрибути или ненадгледувани пристапи кои ја манипулираат факторизацијата во лантниот простор на моделите како што е варијационалниот автокодер (VAE) со обука со загуби специфични за задачите. Во оваа работа, предлагаме поларизирано-ВАЕ, пристап кој ги отстранува избраните атрибути во лантен простор базиран на мерките на близина кои ја одразуваат сличноста помеѓу податочните точки во однос на овие атрибути. Ние го применуваме нашиот метод за да ја разделиме семантиката и синтаксиката на речениците и да спроведеме експерименти за трансфер. Поларизираната ВАЕ ја надминува основната вредност на ВАЕ и е конкурентна со најсовремените пристапи, додека е поопшта рамка која се применува на другите задачи за разделување на атрибутите.', 'lt': 'Mokymasis neatsiejamai atspindėti realaus pasaulio duomenis yra sudėtinga atvira problem a. Dauguma ankstesnių metodų daugiausia dėmesio skyrė prižiūrimams metodams, kurie naudoja požymių etiketes, arba neprižiūrimams metodams, kurie manipuliuoja faktorizacija latent in ėje modelių erdvėje, pavyzdžiui, variacinio autokodavimo (VAE), mokymu su konkrečiomis užduotimis susijusiais nuostoliais. Šiame darbe siūlome poliarizuotą VAE metodą, kuris atskleidžia pasirinktus požymius latent in ėje erdvėje, grindžiamą artimumo priemonėmis, atspindinčiomis duomenų taškų panašumą šių požymių atžvilgiu. Mes taikome savo metodą, skirtą atskirti semantiką ir sakinių sintaksą ir atlikti perkėlimo eksperimentus. Polarizuotas VAE viršija bazinę VAE vertę ir yra konkurencinga su naujausiais metodais, tačiau yra labiau bendra sistema, taikoma kitoms atributų atskyrimo užduotims.', 'it': "Imparare rappresentazioni disarticolate dei dati del mondo reale è un problema aperto impegnativo. La maggior parte dei metodi precedenti si è concentrata su approcci supervisionati che utilizzano etichette di attributi o approcci non supervisionati che manipolano la fattorizzazione nello spazio latente di modelli come il variational autoencoder (VAE) attraverso l'addestramento con perdite specifiche per attività. In questo lavoro, proponiamo polarized-VAE, un approccio che districa gli attributi selezionati nello spazio latente basato su misure di prossimità che riflettono la somiglianza tra i punti dati rispetto a questi attributi. Applichiamo il nostro metodo per districare la semantica e la sintassi delle frasi ed effettuare esperimenti di trasferimento. Il VAE polarizzato supera la base VAE ed è competitivo con approcci all'avanguardia, pur essendo più un framework generale applicabile ad altre attività di disantanglement degli attributi.", 'kk': 'Әлемдегі деректердің бөлшектерін үйрену - ашық мәселе. Алдыңғы әдістердің көпшілігі атрибуттар жарлықтарын пайдаланатын, немесе бақылау әдістерін қолдану үлгілердің кеңейтілген орындағы факторизациялауын, мысалы, әртүрлі автокодер (VAE) деп, тапсырманың өзгертілікті жоғалт Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз Polarized-VAE дегенді таңдаймыз, бұл атрибуттардың арасындағы деректер нүктелерінің ұқсастығын көрсетеді. Біз өзіміздің әдімімізді семантикалық және сөйлемелердің синтаксисін шектеп, аудару тәжірибелерін істеу үшін қолданамыз. Поларизирован-VAE VAE негізгі сызығын шектеп, әртүрлі әртүрлі әртүрлі жағдайлармен әсерлі болады, бірақ басқа атрибуттарды тапсырмаларды тапсырмалар үшін қолданылатын жалпы жалпы бағдарлама.', 'ml': 'ലോകത്തെ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത് തുറന്ന പ്രശ്നമാണ്. മുമ്പുള്ള മാതൃകങ്ങളില്\u200d മിക്കവേറെ മാര്\u200dഗ്ഗങ്ങള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു, പ്രത്യേകിച്ച നഷ്ടത്തോടെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന കുറിപ്പുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നോ അല്ലെങ് ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പോളര്\u200dഷന്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്ന വിയായിയെ പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു. അവസാനത്തെ സ്ഥലത്തുള്ള സ്ഥലത്തുള്ള പ്രത്യേകങ്ങള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെ വാക്കുകളുടെ സെമാന്റിക്സും സിന്റാക്സും പ്രയോഗിക്കാനുള്ള നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു പോളാരിറ്റീസ്-വിയായി വിഎ ബെസ്ലൈന്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അവസാനം രാജ്യത്തിന്റെ മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങളോടൊപ്പം മത്സരിക്കുന്നു. മറ്റൊരു പ്രതിഫല', 'mt': 'It-tagħlim ta’ rappreżentazzjonijiet mhux imxekkla tad-dejta tad-dinja reali huwa problem a miftuħa ta’ sfida. Il-biċċa l-kbira tal-metodi preċedenti ffukaw jew fuq approċċi sorveljati li jużaw tikketti tal-attributi jew approċċi mhux sorveljati li jimmanipulaw il-fatturizzazzjoni fl-ispazju moħbi ta’ mudelli bħall-awtokoder varjazzjonali (VAE) permezz ta’ taħriġ bi telf speċifiku għall-kompiti. F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nipproponu approċċ polarizzat-VAE, approċċ li jiżżarma l-attributi magħżula fl-ispazju moħbi bbażat fuq miżuri ta’ viċinanza li jirriflettu s-similarità bejn il-punti tad-dejta fir-rigward ta’ dawn l-attributi. Aħna napplikaw il-metodu tagħna biex inżarmaw is-semantika u s-sintaks tas-sentenzi u nagħmlu esperimenti ta’ trasferiment. VAE polarizzata taqbeż il-linja bażi tal-VAE u hija kompetittiva ma’ approċċi l-aktar avvanzati, filwaqt li tkun aktar qafas ġenerali li huwa applikabbli għal kompiti oħra ta’ diżantegrazzjoni ta’ attributi.', 'ms': 'Membelajar mewakili data dunia nyata adalah masalah terbuka yang menantang. Kebanyakan kaedah terdahulu telah fokus sama ada pada pendekatan yang diawasi yang menggunakan label atribut atau pendekatan yang tidak diawasi yang memanipulasi faktorisasi dalam ruang tersembunyi model seperti auto-pengekod variasi (VAE) dengan latihan dengan kehilangan khusus tugas. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan VAE-polarizasi, pendekatan yang melepaskan pemilihan atribut dalam ruang tersembunyi berdasarkan ukuran kedekatan yang mencerminkan persamaan antara titik data terhadap atribut ini. Kami melaksanakan kaedah kami untuk melepaskan semantik dan sintaks kalimat dan melakukan eksperimen pemindahan. Polarized-VAE outperforms the VAE baseline and is competitive with state-of-the-art approaches, while being more a general framework that is applicable to other attribute disentanglement tasks.', 'mn': 'Дэлхийн өгөгдлийн хувьд хэцүү байдлыг сурах нь нээлттэй асуудал юм. Өмнөх аргын ихэнх арга нь харилцааны etiketүүдийг ашиглаж буй харилцааны загваруудын дараагийн загваруудын хувьд өөрчлөлт автокодлогч (VAE) гэх мэт загваруудын алдагдлын дасгал хөгжүүлэх арга загварууд дээр анхаарлаа хандуулсан. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид polarized-VAE-г санал болгож байна. Энэ арга баримтуудын хамгийн ойролцоогоор байгаа хэмжээсүүд нь өгөгдлийн цэгүүдийн хоорондын тэнцүү байдлыг харуулж буй арга баримтуудыг сольдог. Бид өөрсдийнхөө аргыг өгүүлбөр, синтаксик болон шилжүүлбөр туршилтыг хийхэд ашигладаг. Polarized-VAE нь VAE-ын суурь шугам дээр илүү өрсөлдөг бөгөөд урлагийн тусламжтай өрсөлдөг бөгөөд бусад асуудлыг бусад асуудлын ажил дээр илүү ерөнхий хэлбэртэй байдаг.', 'pl': 'Uczenie się rozdzielonych reprezentacji danych świata rzeczywistego jest wyzwaniem otwartym problemem. Większość poprzednich metod koncentrowała się na podejściach nadzorowanych, które wykorzystują etykiety atrybutów lub podejściach bez nadzoru, które manipulują faktoryzacją w utajonej przestrzeni modeli, takich jak wariancyjny autokoder (VAE) poprzez szkolenie z stratami specyficznymi dla zadania. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy polarized-VAE, podejście, które rozłącza wybrane atrybuty w przestrzeni utajonej w oparciu o miary zbliżenia odzwierciedlające podobieństwo punktów danych w odniesieniu do tych atrybutów. Stosujemy naszą metodę do rozłączania semantyki i składni zdań oraz przeprowadzamy eksperymenty transferowe. Polarized-VAE przewyższa wartość bazową VAE i jest konkurencyjna w stosunku do najnowocześniejszych podejść, a jednocześnie stanowi bardziej ogólne ramy, które mają zastosowanie do innych zadań rozdzielania atrybutów.', 'ro': 'Învățarea reprezentărilor dezinteresate ale datelor din lumea reală este o problemă deschisă provocatoare. Cele mai multe metode anterioare s-au concentrat fie pe abordări supravegheate care utilizează etichete de atribute, fie abordări nesupravegheate care manipulează factorizarea în spațiul latent al modelelor, cum ar fi variațional autoencoder (VAE), prin instruire cu pierderi specifice sarcinilor. În această lucrare, propunem VAE polarizat, o abordare care dezlega atributele selectate în spațiul latent bazate pe măsuri de proximitate care reflectă similaritatea dintre punctele de date în ceea ce privește aceste atribute. Aplicăm metoda noastră de a dezlega semantica și sintaxa propozițiilor și de a efectua experimente de transfer. VAE polarizat depășește valoarea de referință VAE și este competitiv cu abordările de ultimă generație, fiind în același timp mai mult un cadru general care este aplicabil altor sarcini de dezlegare a atributelor.', 'no': 'Læring av disentanglerte representasjonar av verdensdata er eit vanskeleg opna problem. Dei fleste førre metodane har fokusert på anten oversikte tilnærmingar som brukar attributtmerkelappar eller uavhengige tilnærmingar som manipulerer faktoriseringa i latent plass av modeller, som variasjonal autokoding (VAE) ved opplæring med oppgåvespesifikke tap. I denne arbeida foreslår vi ein tilnærming med polarisert-VAE, og ein tilnærming som dessenterer attributtar i latentet plass basert på nærmeste måtar som reflekterer likheten mellom datapunkt med hensyn til desse attributtane. Vi bruker metoden vårt for å forstyra semantikkane og syntaksen av setningar og utføra overføringsprøymmer. Polarisert-VAE utfører VAE-baselinja og er konkurrentivt med tilnærmingar av kunsten, mens det er meir ein generell rammeverk som er tilgjengeleg for andre attributtforsvingsoppgåver.', 'so': 'Barashada qofka cudurka ah oo macluumaadka caalamiga ah waa dhibaato furan. Inta badan qaababka hore waxay ku focusiyeen qaabab la ilaaliyey oo isticmaalaya calaamado ama qaabab aan la ilaaliyeyn, kaas oo maamula fasaxa ugu dambeeya ee modellada, tusaale ahaan kooxaha bedelka ah (VAE) oo ku tababarida khasaaro gaar ah. Markaas waxan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in cuduradu ay doorato qalabka ugu dambeeya oo ku saleysan qaababka ku soo dhowaanshada oo ku sawiraya isku mid ah barta macluumaadka ee ku saabsan qalabkan. Waxaynu isticmaalaynaa qaababka aan iska jarno qalabka caadooyinka iyo canshuuraha nidaamka, waxaana sameynaynaa imtixaanka wareejinta. Polariisay-VAE wuxuu soo bandhigaa VAE-baseline, wuxuuna ku dadaalaa qaabilaado dowladda farshaxanka, isagoo ka mid ah firaaqad caadiga ah oo ku habboon shaqooyinka kale ee laga jarayo.', 'sr': 'Naučenje raspoloženih predstavljanja podataka na svijetu je izazovan otvoren problem. Većina prethodnih metoda su se fokusirala na nadzorne pristupe koje koriste etikete atributa ili neodređene pristupe koje manipuliraju faktorizaciju u latentnom prostoru modela kao što je variacionalni autokoder (VAE) vježbama sa gubitkama posebnih zadataka. U ovom poslu predlažemo polarizirani-VAE, pristup koji odvaja izradu atribute u latentnom prostoru na temelju mjera bliskosti koja odražava sličnost između tačka podataka u pogledu ovih atributa. Primjenjujemo našu metodu da se rasključimo semantiku i sintaksu rečenica i provodimo eksperimente prijenosa. Polarizirani-VAE iznosi početnu liniju VAE i konkurentni je sa pristupima države umjetnosti, dok je općenitiji okvir koji se primjenjuje na druge zadatke o raspuštanju atributa.', 'si': 'ලෝකයේ දත්තේ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. ගොඩක් පිරිමිති විධානයක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙනවා ප්\u200dරධානය ලේබල් වලින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා නැති විධානය ලේබල් වලින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා විශේෂ ස්වයංක මේ වැඩේ අපි polarised-VAE යෝජනා කරනවා, මේ විශේෂතාවට අනුවෙන් තියෙන අවශ්\u200dය අවශ්\u200dය විශේෂතාවක් තෝරාගන්න පුළුවන් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකා අපි අපේ විධානය අවස්ථානය කරන්නේ වාක්ය සහ වාක්ය සංවිධානය සඳහා වාක්ය සංවිධානය කරන්න. පෝලාරිස්ට්-VAE විසින් VAE බේස්ලයින් වැඩ කරනවා ඒ වගේම ස්ථානයේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විසින් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා, තව සාමාන්\u200dය ස', 'sv': 'Att lära sig lösa representationer av realworld data är ett utmanande öppet problem. De flesta tidigare metoder har fokuserat på antingen övervakade tillvägagångssätt som använder attributetiketter eller obevakade tillvägagångssätt som manipulerar faktoriseringen i det latenta utrymmet av modeller som variabel autoencoder (VAE) genom träning med uppgiftsspecifika förluster. I detta arbete föreslår vi polarized-VAE, ett tillvägagångssätt som kopplar bort utvalda attribut i det latenta utrymmet baserat på närhetsmått som återspeglar likheten mellan datapunkter med avseende på dessa attribut. Vi använder vår metod för att lösa meningarnas semantik och syntax och utföra överföringsexperiment. Polarized-VAE överträffar VAE-baslinjen och är konkurrenskraftig med state-of-the-art tillvägagångssätt, samtidigt som det är mer ett generellt ramverk som är tillämpligt på andra attributavskiljningsuppgifter.', 'ur': 'حقیقی دنیاوی ڈیٹا کی مختلف نمونات کی سیکھنا ایک مشکل کھلی ہے۔ بہت سے پہلے طریقے ہیں کہ ان کی نظارت کی طریقے پر تمرکز کیا جاتا ہے جو آبریٹ لیبل استعمال کرتے ہیں یا ناپابندی کی طریقے استعمال کرتے ہیں جو مدلوں کی لاٹینٹ فضائی میں فاکتوریزی کرتی ہیں جیسے ویرایشن اتوکوڈر (VAE) کی طریقہ سے کام کے مطابق خسارہ کے ذریعہ تطابق اس کام میں ہم پولیاریز-VAE کی پیشنهاد کریں گے، ایک طریقہ جو لٹینٹ جگہ میں آبریٹ کا انتخاب کرتا ہے، اس طریقہ پر تقرب اندازے پر بنیاد رکھتا ہے جو ان آبریٹوں کے بارے میں ڈیٹ پوینٹوں کے درمیان برابری کرتی ہے. ہم اپنے طریقے کو جماعتوں کی سیمنٹیکس اور سینٹکس کو ٹوٹ ڈالنے کے لئے استعمال کرتے ہیں اور انتقال آزمائش کا عمل کرتے ہیں۔ Polarized-VAE بنسٹ لین سے زیادہ اجرا کرتا ہے اور وہ ایست-آرت کے قریبوں سے مسابقه کرتا ہے، حالانکہ اس سے زیادہ عمومی فرمود ہوتا ہے جو دوسرے گروہوں کے بارے میں لازم ہے.', 'ta': 'உலக தரவுகளின் பிரதிநிதிகளை கற்றுக் கொள்வது திறந்த பிரச்சனையாகும். முந்தைய முறைமைகளில் பெரும்பாலான முறைமைகள் கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட செயல்களை பயன்படுத்தும் குறிப்பிட்ட சிட்டைகளை அல்லது காப்பாற்றப்படாத மாதிரிகளின் சமீபத்தில் கா இந்த வேலையில், நாம் தோலியமாக்கப்பட்ட VAE, நோய்கள் சமீபத்தில் உள்ள வெளியீட்டில் குணங்களை தேர்ந்தெடுக்கும் செயல்பாடுகளை பார்க்கும் தகவல் புள நாங்கள் எங்கள் முறைமையை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் பாதிப்பு மற்றும் வாக்கியங்களின் ஒத்திசைவு மற்றும் மாற்றி பரிச Polarized-VAE VAE அடிப்படைக்கோட்டை வெளியேற்றுகிறது மற்றும் நிலையான- கலை முறைமைகளுடன் போராட்டியாக இருக்கிறது, ஆனால் அது மற்ற குணங்கள் தடை செய்யு', 'uz': "Oxirgi dunyodagi maʼlumotlar tashkilotlarini o'rganish ochiq muammolar. Koʻpchilik oldingi usullar ishlatadigan amalning xossalari yoki saqlanmagan usullardan foydalanuvchi soʻzlardan foydalaniladigan soʻzlardan foydalaniladigan soʻzlardan foydalanish mumkin. Vazifaning xossalari bilan ishlab chiqarish mumkin. Ushbu vazifani biz o'zgarishni tasavvur qilamiz. Ushbu vazifaning soniyalarning eng oxirgi boʻsh joydagi atributlarni tanlash mumkin. Biz so'zlarning semantik va bir necha sintaktika qo'llash va transfer tizimini bajarish usulini qo'llamiz. Polariyasiz VAE (VAE) asosiy bazasini bajaradi va davlat soʻzlarning holatida rivojlanadi, ammo boshqa hodisa vazifalar uchun qo'llanmalar boʻlgan umumiy freymi bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Học cách làm méo các biểu tượng trên thế giới thực là một vấn đề khó khăn. Hầu hết các phương pháp trước đều tập trung vào các phương pháp giám sát dùng các nhãn hiệu thuộc chất hay các phương pháp không giám sát điều khiển sự phân tích trong các mô hình tiềm năng như mã tự mã số khác nhau (VAE) bằng việc huấn luyện với các mất đặc biệt. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề xuất các phân tán nhiệt độ cao, một cách tiếp cận tách những thuộc tính ẩn dựa trên các biện pháp gần gũi, phản ánh sự tương đồng giữa các điểm dữ liệu đối với các thuộc tính này. Chúng tôi dùng phương pháp của mình để tách biệt ngữ pháp và cú pháp của các câu và thực hiện các thí nghiệm chuyển nhượng. Polaritán-VAE vượt qua hoàn cảnh của VAE và đang cạnh tranh với các phương pháp hiện đại, mặc dù là một cơ sở chung áp dụng cho các công việc tách rời khác.', 'bg': 'Изучаването на неразрешени представи на реалните данни е предизвикателен отворен проблем. Повечето предишни методи са се фокусирали върху надзорни подходи, които използват етикети на атрибути, или ненадзорни подходи, които манипулират факторизацията в латентното пространство на модели като вариационния автокодер (ВАЕ) чрез обучение със специфични за задачата загуби. В тази работа предлагаме поляризиран подход, който разгръща избраните атрибути в латентното пространство въз основа на мерките за близост, отразяващи сходството между точките на данни по отношение на тези атрибути. Ние прилагаме нашия метод за разгадаване на семантиката и синтаксиса на изреченията и провеждаме трансферни експерименти. Поляризираното VAE превъзхожда базовата линия на VAE и е конкурентно на най-съвременните подходи, като същевременно е по-обща рамка, която е приложима за други задачи за разединяване на атрибути.', 'hr': 'Naučenje raspoloženih predstavljanja podataka na svijetu je izazovan otvoren problem. Većina prethodnih metoda se fokusirala na nadzorne pristupe koje koriste etikete atributa ili nepotrebne pristupe koje manipuliraju faktorizaciju u latentnom prostoru modela poput varijacijskog autokodera (VAE) vježbama s gubitkama posebnim zadacima. U ovom poslu predlažemo polarizirani VAE-a, pristup koji se uključuje odabrati atribute u latentnom prostoru na temelju mjera bliskosti koja odražavaju sličnost između to čki podataka u pogledu tih atributa. Primjenjujemo našu metodu da se rasključimo semantiku i sintaks rečenica i provodimo eksperimente prijenosa. Polariziran-VAE iznosi početnu liniju VAE-a i konkurentna je s pristupima države umjetnosti, dok je općenitiji okvir koji se primjenjuje na druge zadatke o raspuštanju atributa.', 'nl': 'Het leren van ontrafelde representaties van realworld data is een uitdagend open probleem. De meeste eerdere methoden hebben zich toegespitst op ofwel begeleide benaderingen die kenmerklabels gebruiken, ofwel op onbeheerde benaderingen die de factorisatie manipuleren in de latente ruimte van modellen zoals de variantionele autoencoder (VAE) door training met taakspecifieke verliezen. In dit werk stellen we polarised-VAE voor, een benadering die geselecteerde attributen in de latente ruimte ontkoppelt op basis van nabijheidsmetingen die de gelijkenis tussen gegevenspunten met betrekking tot deze attributen weerspiegelen. We passen onze methode toe om de semantiek en syntaxis van zinnen te ontwarren en voeren transferexperimenten uit. Gepolariseerde VAE presteert beter dan de VAE-baseline en is concurrerend met state-of-the-art benaderingen, terwijl het meer een algemeen raamwerk is dat van toepassing is op andere taken voor het ontkoppelen van attributen.', 'da': 'At lære ukontrollerede repræsentationer af realworld data er et udfordrende åbent problem. De fleste tidligere metoder har fokuseret på enten overvågede tilgange, der bruger attributetiketter, eller ubevågede tilgange, der manipulerer faktoriseringen i det latente rum af modeller som variabel autoencoder (VAE) ved at træne med opgavespecifikke tab. I dette arbejde foreslår vi polariseret VAE, en tilgang, der afbryder udvalgte attributter i det latente rum baseret på nærhedsmålinger, der afspejler ligheden mellem datapunkter i forhold til disse attributter. Vi anvender vores metode til at udskille semantikken og syntaksen af sætninger og udføre overførselseksperimenter. Polarized-VAE overstiger VAE basislinjen og er konkurrencedygtig med state-of-the-art tilgange, samtidig med at de mere er en generel ramme, der gælder for andre attribut adskillelse opgaver.', 'id': 'Mempelajari rappresentasi dari data dunia nyata adalah masalah terbuka yang menantang. Kebanyakan metode sebelumnya telah fokus pada pendekatan yang diawasi yang menggunakan label atribut atau pendekatan yang tidak diawasi yang memanipulasi faktorisasi dalam ruang latent model seperti variasi otokoder (VAE) dengan latihan dengan kehilangan-kehilangan khusus tugas. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan polarizasi-VAE, pendekatan yang melepaskan atribut terpilih di ruang latent berdasarkan ukuran dekat yang merefleksikan persamaan antara titik data mengenai atribut-atribut ini. Kami menerapkan metode kami untuk melepaskan semantik dan sintaks kalimat dan melakukan eksperimen transfer. Polarized-VAE outperforms the VAE baseline and is competitive with state-of-the-art approaches, while being more a general framework that is applicable to other attribute disentanglement tasks.', 'de': 'Das Erlernen von entkoppelten Darstellungen realer Daten ist ein herausforderndes offenes Problem. Die meisten bisherigen Methoden konzentrierten sich entweder auf überwachte Ansätze, die Attributlabels verwenden, oder auf unbeaufsichtigte Ansätze, die die Faktorisierung im latenten Raum von Modellen wie dem Variationalen Autoencoder (VAE) durch Training mit aufgabenspezifischen Verlusten manipulieren. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir polarisized-VAE vor, einen Ansatz, der ausgewählte Attribute im latenten Raum auf Basis von Näherungsmaßen entwirrt, die die Ähnlichkeit zwischen Datenpunkten in Bezug auf diese Attribute widerspiegeln. Wir wenden unsere Methode an, um Semantik und Syntax von Sätzen zu entwirren und Transferexperimente durchzuführen. Polarized-VAE übertrifft die VAE-Basislinie und ist mit modernsten Ansätzen konkurrierend, während es sich eher um ein allgemeines Framework handelt, das auf andere Aufgaben zur Attributtrennung anwendbar ist.', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن نمایش\u200cهای مختلف از داده\u200cهای دنیا یک مشکل سخت باز است. بیشتر روش\u200cهای قبلی روی روش\u200cهایی که از نقاشی\u200cهای ویژه\u200cها یا روش\u200cهای غیرقانونی استفاده می\u200cکنند، تمرکز می\u200cکنند که فعالیت\u200cسازی در فضای latent از مدل\u200cها مانند کودهر خودکار متفاوتی (VAE) با تمرین با خسارت\u200cهای ویژه\u200cی کار می\u200cکنند. در این کار، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم VAE، روش\u200cای که در فضای latent برگزیدن ویژه\u200cهای برگزیده می\u200cکند، بر اساس اندازه\u200cهای نزدیکی که مشابه\u200cای بین نقطه\u200cهای داده\u200cها در مورد این ویژه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهد. ما روش خودمون رو براي نابود کردن سيمانتيک و سينتکس جمله ها استفاده ميکنيم و آزمايشات انتقال رو انجام ميديم پایین پایین پایین پایین VAE را پایین می\u200cکند و با نزدیک\u200cهای دولت هنر رقابت می\u200cکند، در حالی که یک چهارچوب عمومی بیشتری باشد که برای other attributes disruption.', 'tr': "Dünýä maglumatyň boşluksuz temsillerini öwrenmek çözümli a çyk meseledir. Iň kop öňki metodlar ýa-da atribut etiketleri ullanýan, ýada taýýarlanmadyk nusgalary üçin, nusgalaryň iň soňky seleňde faýllary üýtgedýän awtomatik kodeýan (VAE) ýaly nusgalary üçin üýtgedýän metodlara üns berildi. Bu işde, polarized-VAE'i, bu atributlar bilen meňzeşligi çykarýan bir metod saýlaýar. Semantik ve sözlerin sintaksini boşaltmak için yönümizi uygulayıp, işlemleri geçirmek için uygulayıp geçiriyoruz. Polarized-VAE VAE esasy çyzygyny üstün edýär we sungatçy ýakynlaşyklaryň durumy bilen duşuşykly, başga atributleri çykarmak görenlere uygun bir umumy çerçewçilikdir.", 'sw': 'Kujifunza wakilishi wa takwimu za dunia zilizo na ugonjwa ni tatizo la wazi. Utawala mwingi wa zamani umejikita kwenye mbinu zinazofuatiliwa zinazotumia alama au mbinu zisizo hifadhiwa zinazodhibiti viwanda katika nafasi ya hivi karibuni ya mifano kama vile vile upande wa mabadiliko (VAE) kwa mafunzo na hasara maalum ya kazi. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza VAE yenye uchaguzi, mbinu ambazo magonjwa yanachagua vifaa katika anga la hivi karibuni kwa kutumia hatua za karibuni zinazoonyesha usawa kati ya pointi za data kuhusiana na tabia hizi. Tunatumia njia yetu ya kupunguza mifano na usangazaji wa hukumu na kutekeleza majaribio ya uhamiaji. VAE yenye utaratibu wa VAE huendesha msingi wa VAE na anashindana na mbinu za hali ya sanaa, wakati ambapo ni mfumo wa jumla unaotumika kwa kazi nyingine za kuhusiana na mazingira.', 'ko': '현실 세계 데이터를 배우는 비협조는 도전적인 개방 문제임을 나타낸다.대부분의 이전 방법은 속성 라벨을 사용하는 감독 방법에 집중되었거나 임무에 특정한 손실을 훈련하여 모델의 잠재 공간에서의 인자 분해를 조종하는 무감독 방법, 예를 들어 변분 자동 인코더(VAE)를 사용했다.이 작업에서 우리는 극화VAE를 제기했다. 이것은 데이터점 간의 이러한 속성에 대한 유사성을 반영하는 인접성 도량을 바탕으로 잠재 공간에서의 선택 속성을 분리하는 방법이다.우리는 우리의 방법을 응용하여 문장의 의미와 문법을 정리하고 이동 실험을 진행한다.극화 VAE는 VAE 기선보다 우수하고 가장 선진적인 방법과 경쟁하며 더욱 통용되는 구조로 다른 속성 분해 임무에 적용된다.', 'am': 'የዓለም አካባቢዎች መልዕክቶች መማር የተከፈተ መከራ ነው፡፡ የቀድሞው የፊደል ደረጃዎች በተመለከተ የፖስታ ምልክቶች ወይም ያልጠበቀው መጠቀሚያ ማቀናጃ ላይ ተማክሮአል፡፡ In this work, we propose polarized-VAE, an approach that disentangles select attributes in the latent space based on proximity measures reflecting the similarity between data points with respect to these attributes.  የሥርዓት እና የፍርድ ሲንካስታውን እና የመለስ ፈተና እናደርጋለን፡፡ Polarized-VAE የVAE መደገፊያውን ባደረገ እና በሀገር-የ-አርእስት ግንኙነት ይታገናኛል፡፡', 'sq': 'Mësimi i përfaqësimeve të pakënaqura të të dhënave të botës reale është një problem i hapur i sfidueshëm. Shumica e metodave të mëparshme janë përqëndruar ose në qasjet e mbikqyrura që përdorin etiketa të atributeve apo qasjet e pa mbikqyrura që manipulojnë faktorizimin në hapësirën e fshehtë të modeleve të tilla si autokoduesi variacional (VAE) duke trajnuar me humbje specifike për detyrat. Në këtë punë, propozojmë të polarizuar-VAE, një qasje që zhvendos atributet e zgjedhur në hapësirën e fshehtë bazuar në masat e afërsisë që pasqyrojnë ngjashmërinë midis pikave të dhënave lidhur me këto atribute. Ne aplikojmë metodën tonë për të shpërndarë semantikën dhe sintaksin e fjalëve dhe për të kryer eksperimente transferimi. VAE e polarizuar e kalon bazën e VAE dhe është konkurruese me qasjet më të larta, ndërsa është më shumë një kuadër i përgjithshëm që është i aplikueshëm për detyrat e tjera të shpërndarjes së atributeve.', 'af': "Die leer van onverwante voorstellings van die werklike wêreld data is 'n pragtige oop probleem. Die meeste vorige metodes het fokus gegee op óf ondersoekte toepassings wat eienskappe etikette gebruik of onondersoekte toepassings wat die faktoriseering in die latente ruimte van modele manipuleer soos die variasionale outokoder (VAE) deur onderwerp met opdrag spesifieke verlies. In hierdie werk, voorstel ons polariseerde-VAE, 'n toegang wat onttrek het, kies eienskappe in die latente spasie gebaseer op proximity-maatskappe wat reflekteer die gelykenis tussen data punte met betrekking na hierdie eienskappe. Ons wend ons metode toe om die semantieke en sintaks van teikens te verwerp en uitvoer oordrag eksperimente. Polarised-VAE uitvoer die VAE basislien en is medelykbaar met staat-van-die-kuns toegang, terwyl meer 'n algemene raamwerk is wat toewenbaar is aan ander eienskappe ontsondering opdragte.", 'az': 'Dünya məlumatının dəyişdirilməsini öyrənmək çətin a çıq problemidir. Əvvəlki metodların əksəriyyəti təhsil etiketlərini və ya təhsil edilməmiş metodlarını istifadə edən təhsil etiketlərini və ya təhsil edilməmiş metodlarını, modellərin sonrakı uzaqlarında fərqləndirilməsini manipul edən təhsil edilməsi kimi variasyon autokoder (VAE) ilə təhsil edir. Bu işdə, polarized-VAE təklif edirik, bu xüsusiyyətlər barəsində məlumat nöqtələri arasındakı məlumatlar arasındakı məlumatlar arasındakı məlumatlar arasındakı məlumatların məlumatlarının məlumatlarını təşkil edir. Biz öz metodumuzu sözlərin semantik və sintaksini çəkmək üçün istifadə edirik və təkrar eksperimentlərini gerçəkləşdiririk. Polarized-VAE VAE sinyalini a şkar edir və sanat tərzində mübahisə edir, digər tərzindən çəkinmə işlərinə uyğun genel bir çerçive olaraq.', 'bn': 'পৃথিবীর তথ্যের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখতে পারে এটা খোলা সমস্যার একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ। বেশীরভাগ পূর্ববর্তী পদ্ধতিগুলোর উপর মনোযোগ দিয়েছে যেগুলো বৈশিষ্ট্য লেবেল ব্যবহার করে অথবা সংরক্ষিত অকার্যকর উপায় ব্যবহার করে যা মডেলের সাম্প্রতিক স্থানে ক্যাক্ট এই কাজে আমরা প্রস্তাব করি যে ভিএই-এর প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে, যেখানে সাম্প্রতিক জায়গায় অস্ত্র বেছে নেয়া হয়েছে সেখানে ক্ষেত্রে ক্ষেত্রের বৈশিষ্ট্য নির আমরা আমাদের পদ্ধতি প্রয়োগ করি সেমেন্টিক্স এবং শাস্তির সিন্ট্যাক্স এবং পরীক্ষা করার জন্য। পোলারিজ-ভিয়াই ভিএই বেসারেলাইনে প্রতিযোগিতা করছে এবং রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের প্রতিযোগিতা দিয়ে প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিদ্বন্দ্বিতা করছে, যদিও সাধারণ কা', 'hy': 'Իրական աշխարհի տվյալների առանձին պատկերացումների սովորելը բաց խնդիր է: Նախորդ մեթոդների մեծ մասը կենտրոնացել է կամ վերահսկված մոտեցումների վրա, որոնք օգտագործում են առանձնահատկությունների պիտակներ կամ անվերահսկված մոտեցումներ, որոնք կառավարում են գործոնավորումը մոդելների թաքնված տարածքում, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ տարբերակային ավտոկոդերը (VԷ In this work, we propose polarized-VAE, an approach that disentangles select attributes in the latent space based on proximity measures reflecting the similarity between data points with respect to these attributes.  Մենք կիրառում ենք մեր մեթոդը, որպեսզի բաժանենք սեմանտիկան և նախադասությունների սինտաքսը և կատարենք փոխանցման փորձեր: Պոլարիզացված ՎԱԵ-ն արտադրում է ՎԱԵ հիմքը և մրցակցում է ամենաբարձր մոտեցումների հետ, մինչդեռ ավելի ընդհանուր հիմք է, որը կիրառվում է այլ առանձնահատկությունների բաժանման խնդիրների համար:', 'bs': 'Naučenje neodređenih predstavljanja podataka na svijetu je izazovan otvoren problem. Većina prethodnih metoda su se fokusirala na nadzorne pristupe koje koriste etikete atributa ili nepotrebne pristupe koje manipuliraju faktorizaciju u latentnom prostoru modela poput varijantnog autokodera (VAE) treniranjem sa gubitkama posebnih zadataka. U ovom poslu predlažemo polarizirani-VAE, pristup koji odvaja izrazu atributa u latentnom prostoru na temelju mjera bliskosti koja odražava sličnost između tačka podataka u pogledu tih atributa. Primjenjujemo našu metodu da se rasključimo semantiku i sintaksu rečenica i provodimo eksperimente prijenosa. Polariziran-VAE iznosi početnu liniju VAE-a i konkurentna je s pristupima države umjetnosti, dok je općenitiji okvir koji se primjenjuje na druge zadatke o raspuštanju atributa.', 'ca': "Aprendre representacions desorientades de les dades del món real és un problem a obert desafiant. La majoria dels mètodes anteriors s'han centrat en enfocaments supervisats que utilitzen etiquetes d'atributs o enfocaments no supervisats que manipulen la factorització en l'espai latent de models com l'autocodificador variacional (VAE) fent entrenament amb pèrdues específices de tasques. En aquesta feina, proposem una EVA polaritzada, un enfocament que desbloqueja seleccions d'atributs a l'espai latent basat en mesures de proximitat que reflexionen la similitud entre punts de dades en relació a aquests atributs. Aplicam el nostre mètode per desmantellar la semàntica i la sintaxi de frases i fer experiments de transfer ència. El VAE polaritzat supera la base de referència del VAE i és competitiu amb els enfocaments més avançats, mentre que és més un marc general que s'aplica a altres tasques de desenvolupament d'atributs.", 'cs': 'Učení se nezaměnitelných reprezentací dat reálného světa je náročným otevřeným problémem. Většina předchozích metod se zaměřila buď na supervizované přístupy, které používají atributové štítky, nebo na bezdozorované přístupy, které manipulují faktorizací v latentním prostoru modelů, jako je variační autokodér (VAE) tréninkem s úlohovými ztrátami. V této práci navrhujeme polarizovaný-VAE přístup, který odděluje vybrané atributy v latentním prostoru na základě měření blízkosti odrážejících podobnost datových bodů s ohledem na tyto atributy. Používáme naši metodu k odpojení sémantiky a syntaxe vět a provádíme transferové experimenty. Polarizovaný VAE překonává základní hodnotu VAE a je konkurenceschopný nejmodernějším přístupům, přičemž je spíše obecným rámcem, který je použitelný pro další úkoly rozpoznávání atributů.', 'et': 'Reaalmaailma andmete lahutamatute esituste õppimine on keeruline avatud probleem. Enamik varasemaid meetodeid on keskendunud kas juhitavatele lähenemisviisidele, mis kasutavad atribuudimärgiseid, või järelevalveta lähenemisviisidele, mis manipuleerivad faktorisatsiooni mudelite latentses ruumis, nagu variatsiooniline autokodeerija (VAE), treenides ülesandepõhiste kaotustega. Selles töös pakume välja polariseeritud VAE, lähenemisviisi, mis lahutab latentses ruumis valitud atribuudid lähedusmõõtude põhjal, mis peegeldavad andmepunktide sarnasust nende atribuutide suhtes. Me rakendame oma meetodit lausete semantika ja süntaksi lahutamiseks ning ülekandekatsete teostamiseks. Polariseeritud VAE tulemused ületavad VAE algväärtust ja konkureerivad kaasaegsete lähenemisviisidega, olles samas rohkem üldine raamistik, mida kohaldatakse muude atribuutide lahutamise ülesannete puhul.', 'fi': 'Reaalimaailman datan hajautettujen esitysten oppiminen on haastava avoin ongelma. Useimmat aikaisemmat menetelmät ovat keskittyneet joko ohjattuihin lähestymistapoihin, joissa käytetään attribuuttitunnuksia, tai valvomattomiin lähestymistapoihin, jotka manipuloivat faktorisointia mallien piilevässä tilassa, kuten variational autoencoder (VAE) harjoittelemalla tehtäväkohtaisia tappioita. Tässä työssä ehdotamme polarisoitua VAE-menetelmää, joka purkaa latenttiavaruudessa valitut attribuutit läheisyysmittausten perusteella, jotka heijastavat datapisteiden samankaltaisuutta näiden attribuuttien suhteen. Käytämme menetelmää lauseiden semantiikan ja syntaksin purkamiseen sekä siirtokokeiden tekemiseen. Polarized-VAE suoriutuu VAE-perusaikataulusta paremmin ja kilpailee uusimpien lähestymistapojen kanssa, mutta se on pikemminkin yleinen kehys, jota voidaan soveltaa muihin attribuuttien purkamistehtäviin.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé sing isih perusahaan langgar-sistem sing wis nguasai karo akeh nguasai perusahaan attribut Nang gunggo iki, kita ndhukung polaribed-VE, akhir babagan ingkang disentangle Awak dhéwé ngerasakno pertama awak dhéwé nggawe semanti karo sinaksi kuwi nggawe nguasai perbudhakan winih politenessoffpolite-Vale kang angkang dipolerané terakhi sing bakal nggawe bakal terus maring karo hal-karo perusahaan-karo seni segala macem kuwi nggawe sistem sing wis dipolerané karo atiribute sing wis ngawehi.', 'sk': 'Učenje različnih predstavitev podatkov realnega sveta je zahteven odprt problem. Večina prejšnjih metod je bila osredotočena bodisi na nadzorovane pristope, ki uporabljajo oznake atributov, bodisi nenadzorovane pristope, ki manipulirajo faktorizacijo v latentnem prostoru modelov, kot je variacijski samokodirnik (VAE) z usposabljanjem z izgubami, specifičnimi za nalogo. V tem delu predlagamo polarizirano-VAE, pristop, ki loči izbrane atribute v latentnem prostoru na podlagi meril bližine, ki odražajo podobnost med podatkovnimi točkami glede teh atributov. Našo metodo uporabljamo za ločevanje semantike in sintakse stavkov ter izvajanje poskusov prenosa. Polarized-VAE presega osnovno vrednost VAE in je konkurenčen z najsodobnejšimi pristopi, medtem ko je bolj splošni okvir, ki se uporablja za druga opravila ločevanja atributov.', 'ha': "Akwai karatun masu da aka samu da danne a cikin dũniya ta zama wata muramma mai buɗa ɗãwa. Babu mafi yawan shiryoyin ayuka da suka riga suka zura ido a kan su yi amfani da alama masu tsari ko shiryoyi da ba'a tsare su ba, wanda ya shagala fabori cikin filin na ƙarshen motel kamar shirin kwamfyuta farat ɗaya (vAEe) da kuma a yi wa aikin haske-haske na-aikin. Daga wannan aikin, Munã ƙayyade tunkuɗe-vAU, wata hanyarwa wanda bukogi ke zãɓi halin cikin fili na ƙarshe, a kan ƙayyade taki masu kusanta, sunã yin fanati da tsakanin pointi na data game da wannan halin. Tuna amfani da hanyoyinmu dõmin ka sami mutane da kalmõmi, kuma mu sami taƙaitarwa. Polarinsa-V AU na samar da basalin WAU kuma yana yin competiti da halin-sananni, alhãli kuwa yana da mafi ƙaranci firam mai amfani da wasu aikin da aka kashe shi.", 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་ན་དང་འཛམ་གླིང་ཡོད་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་སྟོན་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་དག་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་རེད། Most previous methods have focused on either supervised approaches which use attribute labels or unsupervised approaches that manipulate the factorization in the latent space of models such as the variational autoencoder (VAE) by training with task-specific losses. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་འདི་ལྟར་བཤད་པའི་-VAE རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཅིག་སྤྲོད་དགོས། གནད་དོན་གྱིས་འདྲ་བའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཚོའི་ནང་གི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་སྔར་སྒྲིག་དང་ཚིག་གི་ཚིག་ཕུད་སྒྲིག་ཀྱི་ཚིག་རྟགས་དང་སྐྱེས་པའི་བརྟག་སྟོན་ཕུད་ Polarized-VAE ཡིས་VAE གཞི་རྟེན་དང་འདྲ་བའི་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་གནས་སྟངས་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏན་ཁེལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།', 'he': 'ללמוד מייצגים מחוסרים של נתונים בעולם האמיתי היא בעיה פתוחה מאתגרת. רוב השיטות הקודמות התמקדו באמצעות גישות שולטות אשר משתמשות בתוויות תכונות או באמצעות גישות לא שולטות שמניפוליציה את המפעלים בחלל הסתיר של דוגמנים, כמו המקודד האוטומטי המיוחד (VAE) על ידי אימון עם אבדות מסויימות למשימות. In this work, we propose polarized-VAE, an approach that disentangles select attributes in the latent space based on proximity measures reflecting the similarity between data points with respect to these attributes.  אנחנו משתמשים בשיטה שלנו כדי לפרוק את הסמנטיקה וסינטקס של משפטים ולבצע ניסויים העברה. VAE פולאריזציה יוצאת מעבר לבסיס VAE והיא תחרותית עם גישות מוקדמות, בזמן שהיא יותר מסגרת כללית שמתאימת למשימות הפרידה של תכונות אחרות.'}
{'en': 'FEWS : Large-Scale, Low-Shot Word Sense Disambiguation with the Dictionary', 'ar': 'FEWS: توضيح معنى الكلمة على نطاق واسع ومنخفض اللقطات باستخدام القاموس', 'pt': 'FEWS: Desambiguação de sentido de palavras em grande escala e baixo alcance com o dicionário', 'fr': 'FEWS\xa0: Désambiguïsation du sens des mots à grande échelle avec le dictionnaire', 'es': 'FEWS: Desambiguación del sentido de las palabras a gran escala y de bajo alcance con el diccionario', 'ja': 'FEWS:辞書との大規模で低い単語センスの曖昧さを解消する', 'zh': 'FEWS:用字典大下射速词义', 'hi': 'FEWS: बड़े पैमाने पर, कम शॉट शब्द भावना शब्दकोश के साथ disambiguation', 'ru': 'FEWS: Крупномасштабное, низкочастотное дезагрегирование слов со словарем', 'ga': 'FEWS: Díbhrí ar Mhórscála, Ciall Focal Íseal leis an bhFoclóir', 'ka': 'FEWS: დიდი- სკეალი, მარტივი- სკენ სიტყვების გამოცდილება სიტყვებით', 'el': 'Μεγάλες κλίμακας, χαμηλής εμβέλειας αποσαφήνιση λέξεων με το λεξικό', 'it': 'FEWS: Disambiguazione del senso delle parole su larga scala e basso impatto con il dizionario', 'mk': 'FEWS: Large-Scale, Low-Shot Word Sense Disambiguation with the Dictionary', 'ms': 'FEWS: Pengambiguasi Sensa Kata Skala Besar, Tinggi Tembak dengan Kamus', 'hu': 'FEWS: Nagy léptékű, alacsony felbontású szóérzék szétbontása a szótárral', 'ml': 'FEWS: നിഘണ്ടിയോടൊപ്പം കുറഞ്ഞ വാക്ക് കുറഞ്ഞ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള നിരവധി', 'mt': 'FEWS: Diżambigwaljazzjoni tas-Sens tal-kliem fuq skala kbira u b’kliem baxx mad-Dikjarnarju', 'kk': 'FEWS: Үлкен масштабы, төменгі сөзді сөздердің сөздігімен бұғаттауы', 'lt': 'FEWS: Didelio masto, mažo žodžio jutimo nesuderinimas su žodynu', 'no': 'FEWS: Stor- skalering, låg- Shot- ord- førsel- avmbiguasjon med ordboka', 'ro': 'FEWS: Deambiguizare la scară largă, cu sens redus al cuvântului cu dicționarul', 'pl': 'FEWS: Wielkoskalowe, niskoskalowe rozjasnienie zmysłu słowa ze słownikiem', 'sr': 'FEWS: Velika skala, niska pucnjava reèi oseæaju disambiguaciju sa reèinarom', 'si': 'FEWS: ලොකු ස්කේල්, low- Shot වචනය සඳහා විශාලකය සඳහා විශාලකය සඳහා අක්\u200dරීය කරනවා', 'so': 'FEWS: Large-Scale, Low-Shot Word Sense Disambition with the dictionary', 'sv': 'FEWS: Stor skala, låg skott ordsinne Disambiguation med ordboken', 'ta': 'FEWS: அகராதியுடன் பெரிய அளவு, குறைந்த- ஷாட் வார்த்தையின் அலங்காரத்துடன் உணர்வு வடிவமைப்பு', 'ur': 'FEWS: بڑا-اسکیل، کم-Shot Word Sense Disambiguation with the Dictionary', 'mn': 'FEWS: Том-Масштаб, Төмөр-Шүлэг үг мэдрэмжийг Дүгнэлтээс хамгаалах', 'uz': 'FEWS: Large-Scale, Low-Shot Word Sense Disambiguation with the Dictionary', 'vi': 'Sự biến đổi từ ngữ với bộ phận phát ngôn', 'da': 'FEWS: Stor skala, lav-Shot ordsanse Disambiguation med ordbogen', 'hr': 'FEWS: Velika skala, niska pucnjava riječi Disambiguacija sa rečnikom', 'id': 'FEWS: Large-Scale, Low-Shot Word Sense Disambiguation dengan Kamus', 'nl': 'FEWS: Grootschalige, Low-Shot Word Sense Disambiguation met het woordenboek', 'bg': 'МАЙКИ: Разясняване на широкомащабното и ниско чувство на думи с речника', 'de': 'FEWS: Große, Low-Shot Wortsinn-Disambiguation mit dem Wörterbuch', 'sw': 'FEWS: Ukubwa mkubwa, Neno la Kupigwa risasi chini ya Sensi Kupuuzwa kwa Lugha', 'tr': 'FEWS: Ullakan Mazmunlar, Täze-Shot Sözleri Sözlük bilen Çaşyrmak Senedi', 'af': 'Constellation name (optional)', 'ko': 'FEWS: 사전을 사용하여 대규모, 낮은 수준의 의미 변조', 'am': 'መፍጠር', 'hy': 'FEWS: Large-Scale, Low-Shot Word Sense Disambiguation with the Dictionary', 'az': 'FEWS: B칲y칲k-칬l칞칲, Low-Shot Kelimi S칬zl칲y칲 il톛 D톛st톛l톛ndirm톛si', 'bn': 'FEWS: ব্যাপক পরিমাণ, নিম্ন- শুট শব্দের সাথে অভিধানের সাথে সেন্সের বিপর্যয়', 'fa': 'FEWS: مقیاس بزرگ، کلمه پایین\u200cشلیک، ناپدیداری حس کردن با کلمه\u200cنامه\u200c', 'sq': 'FEWS: Shkallë e madhe dhe fjalë me gjuajtje të ulëta', 'bs': 'FEWS: Velika skala, niska pucnjava riječi oslobađanja sa rečnikom', 'ca': 'FEWS: Desambiguació de sentit de paraules a gran escala i baixa disparitat amb el diccionari', 'fi': 'FEWS: Laajamittainen, vähäpätöinen sanaaistin erottelu sanakirjan kanssa', 'cs': 'FEWS: Rozsáhlé rozšíření slovního smyslu s nízkým záběrem se slovníkem', 'et': 'FEWS: Suuremahuline, madala võimsusega sõnastiku eristamine sõnastikuga', 'ha': 'FEWS: Measure mai girma, Tsariya na magana na Low-shot', 'sk': 'VEWS: Razjasnitev obsežnega in nizkega obsega besednega zaznavanja z slovarjem', 'jv': 'FeWS: big-scale, low-shot Word Sense disablmbiguation with the Word', 'bo': 'FEWS: Large-Scale, Low-Shot Word Sense Disambiguation with the Dictionary', 'he': 'מילים גדולות, מילים נמוכות'}
{'en': 'Current models for Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) struggle to disambiguate rare senses, despite reaching human performance on global WSD metrics. This stems from a lack of data for both modeling and evaluating rare senses in existing WSD datasets. In this paper, we introduce FEWS (Few-shot Examples of Word Senses), a new low-shot WSD dataset automatically extracted from example sentences in Wiktionary. FEWS has high sense coverage across different natural language domains and provides : (1) a large training set that covers many more senses than previous datasets and (2) a comprehensive evaluation set containing few- and zero-shot examples of a wide variety of senses. We establish baselines on FEWS with knowledge-based and neural WSD approaches and present transfer learning experiments demonstrating that models additionally trained with FEWS better capture rare senses in existing WSD datasets. Finally, we find humans outperform the best baseline models on FEWS, indicating that FEWS will support significant future work on low-shot WSD.', 'es': 'Los modelos actuales de Desambiguación del Sentido de Palabras (WSD) luchan por desambiguar los sentidos raros, a pesar de alcanzar el rendimiento humano en las métricas globales de WSD. Esto se debe a la falta de datos para modelar y evaluar sentidos raros en los conjuntos de datos de WSD existentes. En este artículo, presentamos FEWS (Few-Shot Examples of Word Senses), un nuevo conjunto de datos WSD de tiro bajo que se extrae automáticamente de oraciones de ejemplo en Wikcionario. FEWS tiene una alta cobertura sensorial en diferentes dominios del lenguaje natural y proporciona: (1) un gran conjunto de entrenamiento que cubre muchos más sentidos que los conjuntos de datos anteriores y (2) un conjunto de evaluación integral que contiene ejemplos de pocos y cero disparos de una amplia variedad de sentidos. Establecemos líneas de base en FEWS con enfoques de WSD neuronales y basados en el conocimiento y presentamos experimentos de aprendizaje por transferencia que demuestran que los modelos entrenados adicionalmente con FEWS capturan mejor los sentidos raros en los conjuntos de datos de WSD existentes. Finalmente, descubrimos que los humanos superan a los mejores modelos de referencia en FEWS, lo que indica que FEWS apoyará un trabajo futuro significativo en la WSD de tiro bajo.', 'ar': 'تكافح النماذج الحالية لإزالة الغموض عن إحساس الكلمات (WSD) لإزالة الغموض عن الحواس النادرة ، على الرغم من الوصول إلى الأداء البشري في مقاييس WSD العالمية. ينبع هذا من نقص البيانات لكل من نمذجة وتقييم الحواس النادرة في مجموعات بيانات WSD الحالية. في هذا البحث ، قدمنا مجموعة بيانات WSD الجديدة ذات اللقطات المنخفضة والمستخرجة تلقائيًا من أمثلة الجمل في ويكاموس (أمثلة قليلة اللقطات من حواس الكلمات). تتمتع FEWS بتغطية عالية عبر مجالات اللغة الطبيعية المختلفة وتوفر: (1) مجموعة تدريب كبيرة تغطي العديد من الحواس أكثر من مجموعات البيانات السابقة و (2) مجموعة تقييم شاملة تحتوي على أمثلة قليلة وصفرية من مجموعة متنوعة من الحواس . نحن نؤسس خطوط أساس على نظام الإنذار المبكر بالمجاعة باستخدام مناهج WSD القائمة على المعرفة والعصبية ونقدم تجارب تعلم النقل التي توضح أن النماذج المدربة بشكل إضافي مع نظام الإنذار المبكر بالمجاعة (FEWS) تلتقط الحواس النادرة بشكل أفضل في مجموعات بيانات WSD الحالية. أخيرًا ، وجدنا أن البشر يتفوقون في الأداء على أفضل النماذج الأساسية في نظام الإنذار المبكر بالمخاطر ، مما يشير إلى أن FEWS ستدعم العمل المستقبلي الهام على WSD منخفض اللقطات.', 'fr': "Les modèles actuels de Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) ont du mal à lever l'ambiguïté des sens rares, malgré les performances humaines atteintes sur les métriques mondiales de WSD. Cela provient d'un manque de données pour la modélisation et l'évaluation des sens rares dans les ensembles de données existants sur les WSD. Dans cet article, nous présentons FEWS (FeW-shot Examples of Word Senses), un nouveau jeu de données WSD low-shot extrait automatiquement à partir d'exemples de phrases dans le Wiktionnaire. FEWS offre une couverture de sens élevée dans différents domaines du langage naturel et fournit\xa0: (1) un large ensemble d'entraînement qui couvre beaucoup plus de sens que les ensembles de données précédents et (2) un ensemble d'évaluation complet contenant des exemples de tirs rares et nuls d'une grande variété de sens. Nous établissons des bases de référence sur FEWS avec des approches basées sur les connaissances et les WSD neuronales et présentons des expériences d'apprentissage par transfert démontrant que les modèles entraînés en plus avec FEWS capturent mieux les sens rares dans les ensembles de données WSD existants. Enfin, nous constatons que les humains surpassent les meilleurs modèles de référence sur les FEWS, ce qui indique que le FEWS soutiendra d'importants travaux futurs sur les DCE à faible dose.", 'pt': 'Os modelos atuais para Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) lutam para desambiguar sentidos raros, apesar de atingir o desempenho humano nas métricas globais de WSD. Isso decorre da falta de dados para modelagem e avaliação de sentidos raros em conjuntos de dados WSD existentes. Neste artigo, apresentamos o FEWS (Few-shot Examples of Word Senses), um novo conjunto de dados WSD low-shot extraído automaticamente de frases de exemplo no Wikcionário. O FEWS tem alta cobertura de sentidos em diferentes domínios de linguagem natural e fornece: (1) um grande conjunto de treinamento que cobre muito mais sentidos do que conjuntos de dados anteriores e (2) um conjunto de avaliação abrangente contendo exemplos de poucos e zero tiros de uma ampla variedade de sentidos . Estabelecemos linhas de base no FEWS com abordagens WSD neurais e baseadas em conhecimento e apresentamos experimentos de aprendizado de transferência demonstrando que modelos adicionalmente treinados com FEWS capturam melhor os sentidos raros em conjuntos de dados WSD existentes. Finalmente, descobrimos que os humanos superam os melhores modelos de linha de base no FEWS, indicando que o FEWS dará suporte a trabalhos futuros significativos em WSD de baixo custo.', 'ja': 'ワードセンス曖昧化（ WSD ）の現在のモデルは、グローバルWSDメトリックで人間のパフォーマンスに達しているにもかかわらず、希少な感覚を曖昧にするのに苦労しています。 これは、既存のWSDデータセットにおける希少な感覚のモデリングと評価の両方のためのデータが不足していることに起因します。 本稿では、Wiktionaryの例文から自動的に抽出された新しいローショットWSDデータセットであるFEWS （ Few - shot Examples of Word Senses ）を紹介する。 FEWSは、さまざまな自然言語領域にわたる高い感覚カバレッジを有し、（ 1 ）以前のデータセットよりも多くの感覚をカバーする大きなトレーニングセット、および（ 2 ）多種多様な感覚のほとんどの例とゼロショットの例を含む包括的な評価セットを提供します。 私たちは、知識ベースおよびニューラルWSDアプローチでFEWSのベースラインを確立し、FEWSで追加訓練されたモデルが既存のWSDデータセットの希少な感覚をよりよく取り込むことを実証する転送学習実験を提示します。 最後に、人間がFEWSの最高のベースラインモデルを上回ることがわかり、FEWSがローショットWSDの将来の重要な研究をサポートすることを示しています。', 'zh': 'Word Sense 消歧 (WSD) 难消罕见之歧义,虽在全局 WSD 指标上致人。 源于乏用建模与评估见 WSD 数集罕见感官之数。 本文引FEWS(单词感官少数镜头示例),此一新卑镜头WSD数集,从维基词典中示例句中自取。 FEWS异域自然语言有高义覆盖率,供:(1)一大练集,涵盖多于前集,及(2)一大评估集,其含诸感官者少与零镜头例。 吾用知神经之WSD,立基线于FEWS,而移学实验,明FEWS练之法WSD可得而数也。 最后见人于FEWS之上,优于至基线,明FEWS将持未来于低射WSD也。', 'hi': 'Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) के लिए वर्तमान मॉडल वैश्विक WSD मैट्रिक्स पर मानव प्रदर्शन तक पहुंचने के बावजूद, दुर्लभ इंद्रियों को अलग करने के लिए संघर्ष करते हैं। यह मौजूदा डब्ल्यूएसडी डेटासेट में मॉडलिंग और दुर्लभ इंद्रियों का मूल्यांकन दोनों के लिए डेटा की कमी से उपजा है। इस पेपर में, हम FEWS (Word Senses के कुछ-शॉट उदाहरण) पेश करते हैं, एक नया कम-शॉट WSD डेटासेट स्वचालित रूप से Wiktionary में उदाहरण वाक्यों से निकाला जाता है। FEWS में विभिन्न प्राकृतिक भाषा डोमेन में उच्च भावना कवरेज है और प्रदान करता है: (1) एक बड़ा प्रशिक्षण सेट जो पिछले डेटासेट की तुलना में कई अधिक इंद्रियों को कवर करता है और (2) एक व्यापक मूल्यांकन सेट जिसमें विभिन्न प्रकार की इंद्रियों के कुछ और शून्य-शॉट उदाहरण होते हैं। हम ज्ञान-आधारित और तंत्रिका डब्ल्यूएसडी दृष्टिकोण के साथ FEWS पर बेसलाइन स्थापित करते हैं और वर्तमान हस्तांतरण सीखने के प्रयोगों का प्रदर्शन करते हैं कि मॉडल अतिरिक्त रूप से FEWS के साथ प्रशिक्षित होते हैं, जो मौजूदा WSD डेटासेट में दुर्लभ इंद्रियों को बेहतर तरीके से कैप्चर करते हैं। अंत में, हम पाते हैं कि मनुष्य FEWS पर सबसे अच्छे बेसलाइन मॉडल से आगे निकलते हैं, यह दर्शाता है कि FEWS कम शॉट वाले WSD पर महत्वपूर्ण भविष्य के काम का समर्थन करेगा।', 'ru': 'Современные модели Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) борются за устранение сомнений в редких чувствах, несмотря на достижение человеческой эффективности по глобальным метрикам WSD. Это связано с отсутствием данных как для моделирования, так и для оценки редких органов чувств в существующих наборах данных WSD. В этой статье мы представляем FEWS (Few-shot Examples of Word Senses), новый набор данных WSD с низким выстрелом, автоматически извлеченный из примеров предложений в Wiktionary. ОСЭТ обладает высоким уровнем охвата различных естественных языков и обеспечивает: 1) большой набор учебных материалов, который охватывает гораздо больше органов чувств, чем предыдущие наборы данных, и 2) комплексный набор оценок, содержащий примеры широкого разнообразия органов чувств с небольшим числом и нулевым снимком. Мы устанавливаем базовые линии по FEWS с подходами, основанными на знаниях и нейронных WSD, и представляем эксперименты по обучению передаче, демонстрирующие, что модели, дополнительно обученные FEWS, лучше фиксируют редкие органы чувств в существующих наборах данных WSD. Наконец, мы находим, что люди превосходят лучшие базовые модели на FEWS, что указывает на то, что FEWS будет поддерживать значительную будущую работу по низкоуровневой WSS.', 'ga': 'Bíonn sé ag streachailt le samhlacha reatha um Dhíbheachtú Focal Sense (WSD) le céadfaí neamhchoitianta a dhí-dhébhriú, in ainneoin feidhmíocht dhaonna a bhaint amach ar mhéadracht domhanda WSD. Eascraíonn sé seo as easpa sonraí le haghaidh samhaltú agus measúnú céadfaí neamhchoitianta i dtacar sonraí WSD atá ann cheana féin. Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid isteach FEWS (Fewshot Examples of Word Senses), tacar sonraí nua WSD íseal-shot a bhaintear go huathoibríoch as abairtí samplacha san Vicífhoclóir. Tá clúdach ard-chiall ag FEWS thar réimsí éagsúla teanga nádúrtha agus soláthraíonn sé: (1) tacar mór oiliúna a chlúdaíonn i bhfad níos mó céadfaí ná tacair shonraí roimhe seo agus (2) tacar meastóireachta cuimsitheach ina bhfuil samplaí beagán agus náid de raon leathan céadfaí. . Bunóimid bunlínte ar FEWS le cur chuige eolas-bhunaithe agus néar-WSD agus cuirimid i láthair turgnaimh foghlama aistrithe a thaispeánann go nglacann múnlaí a bhfuil oiliúint bhreise orthu le FEWS céadfaí annamha i dtacar sonraí WSD atá ann cheana féin. Mar fhocal scoir, feicimid go sáraíonn daoine na samhlacha bonnlíne is fearr ar FEWS, rud a léiríonn go dtacóidh FEWS le hobair shuntasach amach anseo ar WSD lámhaigh íseal.', 'hu': 'A Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) jelenlegi modelljei küzdenek a ritka érzékek egyértelműsítéséért, annak ellenére, hogy az emberi teljesítményt elérték globális WSD mutatókon. Ez abból ered, hogy nem állnak rendelkezésre adatok a meglévő WSD adatkészletek ritka érzékeinek modellezéséhez és értékeléséhez. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a FEWS (Few-shot Examples of Word Senses), egy új alacsony felbontású WSD adatkészletet, amely automatikusan kivont példamondatokból a Wiktionaryban. A FEWS különböző természetes nyelvi területeken magas érzékelési lefedettséggel rendelkezik, és: (1) egy nagy edzéskészletet biztosít, amely sokkal több érzékszervet fed le, mint a korábbi adatkészletek, és (2) egy átfogó értékelési készletet tartalmaz, amely kevés és nulla lövéses példákat tartalmaz a számos érzékszerv széles választékára. Tudásalapú és neurális WSD megközelítésekkel alakítjuk ki a FEWS alapjait, és transzfertanulási kísérleteket mutatunk be, amelyek bizonyítják, hogy a FEWS-vel továbbképzett modellek jobban felismerik a ritka érzékeket a meglévő WSD adatkészletekben. Végezetül azt találtuk, hogy az emberek túlléptek a legjobb alapvető modelleket a FEWS-en, ami azt jelzi, hogy a FEWS jelentős jövőbeli munkát fog támogatni az alacsony lövésű WSD-n.', 'ka': 'მიმდინარე მოდელები სიტყვის სიტყვის განსხვავება (WSD) განსხვავება განსხვავებელი სიტყვის განსხვავებას, თუმცა ადამიანის გამოსახულება დოლობალური WSD მეტრიკის მიზეზეზ ეს მოდელი არსებობისგან იქნება, რომელიც მოდელირება და რეტალური სინუსების განსაზღვრება აქვს WSD მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში. ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ შევცვალოთ FEWS (სიტყვების მაგალითი მაგალითები), ახალი დამატებული WSD მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში ავტომატურად გამოყენებული მაგალითებიდან Wiktionary-ში. FEWS აქვს უფრო დიდი სიგრძნობა განსხვავებული თავისუფლიო დიომენტების კონფიგურაციაში და უფრო დიდი სიგრძნობის კონფიგურაციაში, რომელიც უფრო მეტი სიგრძნობები, ვიდრე წინ მონაცემების კონფიგურაცი ჩვენ FEWS-ის ბაზი ხაზები დავყენებთ, რომლებიც მეცნიერების და ნეიროლური WSD-ის მიღებებით და მიმდინარე გასწავლების ექსპერიმენტები, რომლებიც მოდელები დამატებული FEWS-ზე უფრო უფრო უფრო საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ ვიღებთ ადამიანები უფრო საუკეთესო მოდელები FEWS-ში, რომლებიც აჩვენებს, რომ FEWS იმუშაობს მნიშვნელოვანი მომავალური სამუშაო სამუშა', 'it': "I modelli attuali di Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) faticano a disambiguare i sensi rari, nonostante raggiungano le prestazioni umane sulle metriche WSD globali. Ciò deriva da una mancanza di dati sia per la modellazione che per la valutazione dei sensi rari nei dataset WSD esistenti. In questo articolo presentiamo FEWS (Few-shot Examples of Word Senses), un nuovo set di dati WSD a basso impatto estratto automaticamente dalle frasi di esempio in Wiktionary. FEWS ha un'elevata copertura sensoriale in diversi domini del linguaggio naturale e fornisce: (1) un ampio set di allenamento che copre molti più sensi rispetto ai set di dati precedenti e (2) un set di valutazione completo contenente pochi e zero esempi di un'ampia varietà di sensi. Stabiliamo linee di base su FEWS con approcci WSD basati sulla conoscenza e neurali e presentiamo esperimenti di apprendimento di trasferimento dimostrando che i modelli ulteriormente formati con FEWS catturano meglio i sensi rari nei dataset WSD esistenti. Infine, troviamo che gli esseri umani superano i migliori modelli di base sulle FEWS, indicando che le FEWS sosterranno un significativo lavoro futuro sulle WSD a basso impatto.", 'lt': 'Dabartiniai žodžių jautrumo nedviprasmiškumo modeliai stengiasi išspręsti retus jausmus, nepaisant to, kad žmogaus veiklos rezultatai pasiekti pasauliniu pasauliniu VSD rodikliu. Tai atsiranda dėl duomenų trūkumo modeliuoti ir vertinti retuosius jutimus esamuose VSD duomenų rinkiniuose. Šiame dokumente pristatome FEWS (keli žodžių jausmų pavyzdžiai), naują mažo nuotraukos WSD duomenų rinkinį, automatiškai ištrauktą iš pavyzdžių sakinių Wiktionary. FEWS aprėpia daug prasmės įvairiose gamtinių kalbų srityse ir teikia: (1) didelį mokymo rinkinį, apimantį daug daugiau jutimų nei ankstesnius duomenų rinkinius, ir (2) išsamų vertinimo rinkinį, kuriame pateikiami keli ir nuliniai įvairių jutimų pavyzdžiai. Nustatome FEWS bazes, taikant žiniomis pagrįstus ir nervinius WSD metodus, ir pristatome mokymosi perdavimu eksperimentus, įrodančius, kad modeliai, papildomai parengti su FEWS, geriau aptinka retuosius jutimus esamuose WSD duomenų rinkiniuose. Galiausiai nustatome, kad žmonės viršija geriausius pradinius FEWS modelius, o tai rodo, kad FEWS bus remiamas reikšmingas būsimas darbas mažo poveikio WSD srityje.', 'kk': 'Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) үлгілерінің қазіргі үлгілері жүйелік WSD метрикалықтағы адамдардың істемін жеткізу үшін бейбір сезімдерді өзгерту үшін күреседі. Бұл басқа WSD деректер жиындарында модель және бағалау үшін деректер жоқ болып тұрады. Бұл қағазда FEWS- ті таңдап береміз (Сөздер сезімінің бірнеше мәселелері), Wiktionary- дағы мәселелерден автоматты түрде алып тастаған жаңа WSD деректер жиынын таңдап береміз. FEWS түрлі тіл домендерінде көптеген оқыту жасауы бар және келтіріп береді: (1) алдыңғы деректер жиындарынан көп оқыту жасалған және (2) бірнеше түрлі сезімдердің бірнеше және нөл түрлі мысалдары бар толық оқыту жиыны. Біз білім негізінде және невралдық WSD қасиеттермен FEWS негізінде негізгі сызықтарды құрамыз және аудару оқыту тәжірибелерін көрсету үлгілері бар WSD деректер жиындарында қандай сезімдерді жақсы түсіруге бол Соңында, біз адамдардың FEWS деген ең жақсы негізгі үлгілерін табуға болады. FEWS келесі келесі жұмыс істейтінін көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Сегашните модели за раздвојување на зборовите чувства (WSD) се борат за раздвојување на ретките чувства, и покрај достигнувањето на човечките резултати на глобалната метрика на WSD. Ова потекнува од недостатокот на податоци за моделирање и евалуирање на ретките сетила во постоечките податоци на WSD. Во овој весник, ние претставуваме FEWS (неколку примери на зборни чувства), нов нискоснимен WSD датотек автоматски изваден од примерни реченици во Wiktionary. ФЕВС има високо сетилно покривање низ различни природни јазични домени и обезбедува: (1) голем набор обуки кој покрива многу повеќе сетила отколку претходните податоци и (2) комплетен набор на оценки кој содржи неколку примери од голема различност на сетила. Ние воспоставуваме основни линии за FEWS со пристапи базирани на знаење и неврални WSD и претставуваме експерименти за пренесување на училиште кои демонстрираат дека моделите дополнително обучени со FEWS подобро заземаат ретки сетила во постоечките податоци за WSD. Конечно, откривме дека луѓето ги надминуваат најдобрите основни модели на ФЕВС, индицирајќи дека ФЕВС ќе поддржи значителна идна работа за ниско ниво на ВСД.', 'ms': 'Model semasa untuk Penjelasan Perasaan Perkataan (WSD) berjuang untuk menyatakan perasaan jarang, walaupun mencapai prestasi manusia pada metrik WSD global. Ini berasal dari kekurangan data untuk kedua-dua pemodelan dan penilaian sens jarang dalam set data WSD yang wujud. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan FEWS (contoh-contoh beberapa-shot Senses Word), set data WSD yang ditembak rendah baru secara automatik dikekstrak dari kalimat contoh dalam Wiktionary. FEWS mempunyai penutupan sensor tinggi di seluruh domain bahasa alam yang berbeza dan menyediakan: (1) set latihan besar yang meliputi lebih banyak sensor daripada set data sebelumnya dan (2) set penilaian yang meliputi mengandungi contoh-contoh beberapa- dan sifar-tembakan dari pelbagai sensor yang luas. Kami menetapkan garis dasar pada FEWS dengan pendekatan WSD berdasarkan pengetahuan dan saraf dan mempersembahkan eksperimen pembelajaran pemindahan yang menunjukkan bahawa model secara tambahan dilatih dengan FEWS lebih baik menangkap perasaan jarang dalam set data WSD yang wujud. Akhirnya, kita jumpa manusia melampaui model dasar terbaik pada FEWS, yang menunjukkan bahawa FEWS akan menyokong kerja masa depan yang signifikan pada WSD yang rendah.', 'mt': 'Current models for Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) struggle to disambiguate rare senses, despite reaching human performance on global WSD metrics.  Dan jirriżulta minn nuqqas ta’ dejta kemm għall-immudellar kif ukoll għall-evalwazzjoni ta’ sensi rari fis-settijiet ta’ dejta eżistenti tad-WSD. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nintroduċu FEWS (Eżempji ta’ ftit fotografiji ta’ Sensijiet tal-kliem), sett ġdid ta’ dejta WSD b’fotografija baxxa awtomatikament estratt minn sentenzi eżempji f’Wiktionary. Il-FEWS għandha kopertura b’sens għoli f’oqsma differenti ta’ lingwa naturali u tipprovdi: (1) sett kbir ta’ taħriġ li jkopri ħafna aktar sensi minn settijiet ta’ dejta preċedenti u (2) sett komprensiv ta’ evalwazzjoni li fih ftit eżempji u żero ta’ varjetà wiesgħa ta’ sensi. Aħna nistabbilixxu linji bażi dwar il-FEWS b’approċċi bbażati fuq l-għarfien u newrali tal-WSD u nippreżentaw esperimenti ta’ tagħlim ta’ trasferiment li juru li mudelli mħarrġa addizzjonali mal-FEWS jaqbdu aħjar sensi rari f’settijiet ta’ dejta eżistenti dwar id-WSD. Fl-aħħar nett, isibu li l-bnedmin jaqbżu l-aħjar mudelli ta’ linja bażi dwar il-FEWS, li jindikaw li l-FEWS se jappoġġja ħidma sinifikanti fil-ġejjieni dwar id-WSD b’livell baxx.', 'el': 'Τα τρέχοντα μοντέλα για την αποσαφήνιση της αίσθησης λέξεων (WSD) αγωνίζονται να αποσαφηνίσουν τις σπάνιες αισθήσεις, παρά το γεγονός ότι επιτυγχάνουν την ανθρώπινη απόδοση στις παγκόσμιες μετρήσεις του WSD. Αυτό οφείλεται στην έλλειψη δεδομένων τόσο για τη μοντελοποίηση όσο και για την αξιολόγηση σπάνιων αισθήσεων σε υπάρχοντα σύνολα δεδομένων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εισάγουμε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων χαμηλής εμβέλειας που εξάγεται αυτόματα από παραδειγματικές προτάσεις στο Wiktionary. Έχει υψηλή κάλυψη αισθήσεων σε διαφορετικούς τομείς φυσικής γλώσσας και παρέχει: (1) ένα μεγάλο εκπαιδευτικό σύνολο που καλύπτει πολλές περισσότερες αισθήσεις από προηγούμενα σύνολα δεδομένων και (2) ένα ολοκληρωμένο σύνολο αξιολόγησης που περιέχει παραδείγματα ελάχιστων και μηδενικών εικόνων μιας ευρείας ποικιλίας αισθήσεων. Καθορίζουμε γραμμές βάσης για τη γνώση και τις νευρωνικές προσεγγίσεις και παρουσιάζουμε πειράματα μάθησης μεταφοράς αποδεικνύοντας ότι τα μοντέλα που εκπαιδεύονται επιπλέον με τη γνώση συλλαμβάνουν καλύτερα σπάνιες αισθήσεις σε υπάρχοντα σύνολα δεδομένων. Τέλος, διαπιστώνουμε ότι οι άνθρωποι ξεπερνούν τα καλύτερα μοντέλα βάσης σε FEWS, υποδηλώνοντας ότι οι FEWS θα υποστηρίξουν σημαντική μελλοντική εργασία σε Low-Shot WSD.', 'mn': 'Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) хувилбарын орчин үеийн загвар дэлхийн WSD метрик дээр хүн төрөлхтний үйл ажиллагааг хүртэл ховор мэдрэмжүүдийг бууруулахад тусалдаг. Энэ нь бараг байгаа WSD өгөгдлийн сангийн ховор мэдрэмжүүдийг моделчлэх болон үнэлэх өгөгдлийн аль нэгээс гарч ирсэн. Энэ цаасан дээр бид FEWS-г (жижиг хэмжээний "Word Senses" жишээ) танилцуулдаг. Уикционари дахь жишээнээс автоматжуулсан шинэ WSD өгөгдлийн санг автоматжуулдаг. FEWS нь өөр байгалийн хэл хэлний хэлбэрээс илүү чухал мэдрэмжтэй байдаг бөгөөд: (1) өмнөх өгөгдлийн санаас илүү олон мэдрэмжтэй болон (2) олон төрлийн мэдрэмжтэй жишээлүүдийг бүрдүүлдэг бүрэн дүгнэлт. Бид мэдлэг, мэдлэг, мэдрэлийн WSD арга барилгуудтай FEWS-ын суурь шугам тогтоож, шилжүүлэлт суралцах туршилтуудыг илүү хөгжүүлж байна. Мэдээж байгаа WSD өгөгдлийн суурь дээрх ховор мэдрэмжүүдийг FEWS-тай дасгал сургалты Эцэст нь бид хүмүүс FEWS дээрх хамгийн сайн суурь шугам загваруудыг хийж чадна. FEWS нь дараагийн ирээдүйн ажилд бага загвартай WSD-г дэмжих болно.', 'ml': 'വാക്ക് സെന്\u200dസ് ഡിസ്മിഗ്വേഷന്\u200dറെ (WSD) നിലവിലുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d ലോകത്തില്\u200d മനുഷ്യരുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നതിന് വേ നിലവിലുള്ള വിഎസ്ഡി ഡാറ്റാസറ്റേറ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും മോഡല്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നതിനും വിലപിക്കുന്നതിനും വേണ്ടി ഡേറ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d FEWS (വാക്ക് സെന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ കുറച്ച് എടുത്ത ഉദാഹരണങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും വിക്ട്ടണിയറിയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു പുതിയ വെടിവെക്കപ് FEWS വ്യത്യസ്താവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ ഡോമെന്\u200dസില്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d ഉയര്\u200dന്ന വിവരങ്ങളുണ്ട്. അത് നല്\u200dകുന്നു: (1) മുമ്പുള്ള ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളെക്കാള്\u200d പലതും കൂടുതല്\u200d ശീലിക്കുന്ന ഒര നിലവിലുള്ള WSD ഡാറ്റാസറ്റെറ്റുകളില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നാം FEWS-ല്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്നു അവസാനം, FEWS-ലെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല ബെസ്ലൈന്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് മനുഷ്യരെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു. FEWS കുറച്ച് വെടിവെച്', 'no': 'Gjeldande modeller for Word Sense Disambiguation Dette stemmer frå ein mangling av data for både modellering og evaluering av rare sensar i eksisterande WSD-datasett. I denne papiret introduserer vi FEWS (Få-snitt Eksempel på Word Senses), eit nytt lågt WSD-dataset som automatisk ekstraherer frå eksempel setningar i Wiktionary. FEWS har høg følelsesområde over ulike naturspråkdområde og tilbyr: (1) ein stor opplæring sett som dekkar mange fleire senter enn tidlegare datasett og (2) ein komplett evaluering sett som inneheld få- og nullsatt eksemplar av mange ulike senter. Vi oppretter baselinjer på FEWS med kunnskapsbaserte og nøyrale WSD-tilnærmingar og gjeldande overføringssøklar som demonstrerer at modeller tillegg trengte med FEWS betre å henta sjeldre senter i eksisterande WSD-datasett. Etter slutt, finn vi mennesker ut dei beste baseline modelane på FEWS, som tyder på at FEWS vil støtte signifikante framtidige arbeid på låg-snitt WSD.', 'pl': 'Obecne modele rozproszeń zmysłu Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) zmagają się z rozproszeniem rzadkich zmysłów, mimo osiągnięcia wydajności człowieka w globalnych wskaźnikach WSD. Wynika to z braku danych do modelowania i oceny rzadkich zmysłów w istniejących zbiorach danych WSD. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy FEWS (Few-shot Examples of Word Senses), nowy zestaw danych typu low-shot WSD automatycznie wyodrębniany z przykładowych zdań w Wiktionary. FEWS ma wysoki pokrycie zmysłów w różnych dziedzinach języka naturalnego i zapewnia: (1) duży zestaw treningowy, który obejmuje znacznie więcej zmysłów niż poprzednie zbiory danych oraz (2) kompleksowy zestaw oceny zawierający kilka i zerowych przykładów szerokiej gamy zmysłów. Ustalamy linie bazowe na FEWS z podejściem opartym na wiedzy i neuronowym WSD oraz przedstawiamy eksperymenty uczenia się transferowego pokazujące, że modele dodatkowo trenowane za pomocą FEWS lepiej wychwytują rzadkie zmysły w istniejących zbiorach danych WSD. Wreszcie zauważamy, że ludzie przewyższają najlepsze modele bazowe na FEWS, co wskazuje, że FEWS będzie wspierać znaczące przyszłe prace nad niskim wystrzałem WSD.', 'ro': 'Modelele actuale pentru dezambiguizarea simțurilor cuvintelor (WSD) se luptă să dezambiguizeze simțurile rare, în ciuda atingerii performanțelor umane pe măsurătorile globale ale WSD. Acest lucru provine dintr-o lipsă de date atât pentru modelarea, cât și evaluarea simțurilor rare în seturile de date WSD existente. În această lucrare, introducem FEWS (Câteva exemple de simțuri ale cuvintelor), un nou set de date WSD extras automat din propoziții de exemplu în Wiktionary. FEWS are o acoperire ridicată a simțurilor în diferite domenii ale limbajului natural și oferă: (1) un set mare de instruire care acoperă mult mai multe simțuri decât seturile de date anterioare și (2) un set cuprinzător de evaluare care conține câteva exemple și zero-shot de o mare varietate de simțuri. Stabilim linii de bază pe FEWS cu abordări WSD bazate pe cunoaștere și neurale și prezentăm experimente de învățare de transfer demonstrând că modelele instruite suplimentar cu FEWS captează mai bine simțurile rare în seturile de date WSD existente. În cele din urmă, descoperim că oamenii depășesc cele mai bune modele de bază pe FEWS, indicând faptul că FEWS va susține lucrări semnificative viitoare pe WSD cu lovituri scăzute.', 'sr': 'Trenutni modeli za Disambiguaciju "Word Sense" (WSD) se bore za disambiguaciju retkih čula, uprkos postizanju ljudske funkcije na globalne WSD metrike. To je zbog nedostatka podataka za modeliranje i procjenu retkih čula u postojećim WSD datasetima. U ovom papiru predstavljamo FEWS (Malo snimanja primjera osećanja riječi), novi nizak snimak WSD podataka automatski izvlačen iz primjernih rečenica u Wiktionaryju. FEWS ima visokog smisla preko različitih prirodnih jezičkih domena i pruža: (1) veliku obuku koja pokriva mnoge više čula od prethodnih seta podataka i (2) sveobuhvatnu procjenu koja sadrži nekoliko i nulovnih primjera širokih raznih čula. Postavljamo osnovne linije na FEWS-u sa pristupima na znanju i neuralnim WSD-ima i predstavljamo eksperimente o učenju prijenosa koji pokazuju da su modeli dodatno obučeni FEWS-om bolje uhvatiti rijetke čule u postojećim WSD datasetima. Konačno, našli smo ljude kako izvršavaju najbolje osnovne modele na FEWS-u, ukazujući na to da će FEWS podržati značajan budući rad na niskom pucnjavi WSD-u.', 'so': 'Tusaalada la soo sasa ee hadal Sense Disability (WSD) waxay u dagaalamayaan inay kala duduwanaan emotions nadiifsan, inkastoo ay gaadhaan muuqashada dadka oo ku saabsan metricada WSD caalamiga ah. Tani waxay ka timaadaa baahida macluumaadka sameynta iyo qiimeynta labada sano ee aad u sahlaneyso saxda ah ee ku jira danbiyada WSD. Warqadan waxaan ku soo bandhignaa FEWS (Tusaale-shot of Word Senses), macluumaad cusub oo WSD ah oo si automatic ah looga soo saaray xarumaha tusaale ahaan ee Wiktionary. FEWS has high sense coverage across different natural language domains and provides: (1) a large training set that covers many more senses than previous datasets and (2) a comprehensive evaluation set containing few- and zero-shot examples of a wide variety of senses.  Waxaannu ku qornaa aasaasyo ku qoran FEWS, iyadoo ay ku leedahay qaabab aqoonta iyo neurada WSD ku habboon iyo baaritaanka waxbarashada, taasoo muuqata in modellada lagu baray si dheeraad ah FEWS ugu qabsato sanooyin qaali ah oo ku jira danbiyada WSD. Ugu dambaysta waxaannu heli nahay dad ka samaysa modelalka ugu fiican ee FEWS, waxaynu caddaynaynaa in FEWS uu kaalmeynayo shaqada mustaqbalka oo muhiim ah ee hoos-shot WSD.', 'sv': 'Nuvarande modeller för Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) kämpar för att göra sällsynta sinnen otvetydiga, trots att de uppnått mänsklig prestanda på globala WSD-värden. Detta beror på brist på data för både modellering och utvärdering av sällsynta sinnen i befintliga WSD-dataset. I den här uppsatsen introducerar vi FEWS (Few-shot Exemples of Word Senses), en ny WSD-datauppsättning med låg upplösning som automatiskt extraheras från exempelmeningar i Wiktionary. FEWS har hög sinnesdäckning över olika naturliga språkområden och tillhandahåller: (1) en stor träningsuppsättning som täcker många fler sinnen än tidigare dataset och (2) en omfattande utvärderingsset som innehåller få och nollskott exempel på en mängd olika sinnen. Vi etablerar baselines på FEWS med kunskapsbaserade och neurala WSD-metoder och presenterar överföringsinlärningsexperiment som visar att modeller som dessutom tränats med FEWS bättre fångar sällsynta sinnen i befintliga WSD-dataset. Slutligen finner vi att människor presterar bättre än de bästa basmodellerna på FEWS, vilket indikerar att FEWS kommer att stödja betydande framtida arbete på lågskottiga WSD.', 'ta': 'வார்த்தை உணர்வு குறைந்த உணர்வுகளை புரிந்து கொள்ள தற்போதைய மாதிரிகளுக்கான மாதிரிகள் உலகளாவிய WSD மெட்ரிக்களில் மனித செயல்பாட இது ஏற்கனவே இருக்கும் WSD தகவல் அமைப்புகளில் இருந்து மாதிரியும் மற்றும் சிறிய உணர்வுகளை மதிப்பிடும் தரவு குறைவ இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் FEWS (வார்த்தை உணர்வு எடுத்துக்காட்டுகளின் சிறிய எடுத்துக்காட்டுகள், விக்டிகரியில் உள்ள வாக்கியங்களிலிரு FEWS has high sense coverage across different natural language domains and provides: (1) a large training set that covers many more senses than previous datasets and (2) a comprehensive evaluation set containing few- and zero-shot examples of a wide variety of senses.  நாம் FEWS அடிப்படையில் அடிப்படைகளை நிறுவப்படுத்துகிறோம் அறிவு அடிப்படையான மற்றும் தற்போதைய மாற்றும் கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் பரிசோதனைகள் கொண்டு இப்போது மாதி இறுதியில், FEWS-ல் சிறந்த அடிப்படை மாதிரிகளை மனிதர்கள் செயல்படுத்துவதை நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம், FEWS குறைந்த குறைந்த விளைவ', 'si': 'Word Sense අවශ්\u200dයය (WSD) වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාර විදිහට අවශ්\u200dයය කරනවා, ජාතික WSD මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් වල මිනිස්සුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර වැඩ මේක විදිහට තියෙන්නේ WSD දත්ත සේට් වලින් මොඩේල් එක්ක සහ අවශ්\u200dයය සඳහා දත්ත අවශ්\u200dයයක් නැති වෙන්නේ මේ පැත්තට, අපි FEWS (වචන සම්පූර්ණ උදාහරණයක් ටිකක්) පෙනුම් කරනවා, වික්ටියෝරි වලින් උදාහරණ වලින් අලුත් විස්තාරයක්  FEWS වෙනස් ස්වභාවික භාෂාවක් වලින් හොඳ අදහසක් තියෙනවා: 1) ලොකු ප්\u200dරධානය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධානය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූ අපි දන්නවන් අධාරිත සහ න්\u200dයූරල් WSD අවස්ථාවන් සමග FEWS වලට ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස්ථාපිත කරනවා ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක අන්තිමට, අපි මිනිස්සුන්ව හොයාගන්නේ FEWS වල හොඳම ප්\u200dරමාණ මොඩල් කරනවා කියලා, FEWS වලින් අනාගතයේ අනාගතය වැඩේ අඩුව', 'ur': 'Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) کے لئے موجود موڈل کمزور سنسوں کو آزاد کرنے کے لئے کوشش کرتے ہیں، اگرچہ انسان کی عملکرد گلوبل WSD متریک پر پہنچ جاتی ہے۔ یہ موجود WSD ڈاٹ سٹ میں کمزور سنسوں کے لئے ڈاٹ کے کمزور سے ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم FEWS کو معلوم کرتے ہیں (کم شٹ کی مثالیں) ایک نئی کم شٹ WSD ڈاٹ سٹ Wiktionary میں مثالیں سے اٹھائے جاتے ہیں۔ FEWS کے لئے مختلف طبیعی زبان ڈومین میں بہت سی سمجھ کا پورا پورا کرتا ہے اور وہاں سے ملتا ہے: (1) ایک بڑی آموزش مجموعہ جو پہلے سے بہت سی سمجھ پورے کرتا ہے اور (2) ایک محکم ارزیابی مجموعہ ہے جو بہت سی سمجھ کے مثالیں ہیں۔ ہم FEWS پر بنسس لینٹ بناتے ہیں جو علم اور نیورال WSD کے پاس آتے ہیں اور ترنسیس سیکھنے کی آزمائش پیش کرتے ہیں جو نشان دیتے ہیں کہ مدلز FEWS کے ساتھ اضافہ کی تعلیم کی جاتی ہے اس سے بہتر کم حس حاصل کرتا ہے جو موجود WSD ڈیٹسٹ میں ہے. آخر میں، ہم انسانوں کو FEWS کے سب سے بہترین بنسٹ لین نمونڈے کام کرتے ہیں، نشان دیتے ہیں کہ FEWS کم شٹ WSD کے لئے اثر آینده کام کی مدد کرے گا۔', 'vi': 'Các mô hình hiện thời về biến đổi Từ Thời Báo (WSD) đấu tranh để biến đổi các giác quan hiếm, mặc dù đạt được kết quả con người về lượng tử WSD to àn cầu. Việc này bắt nguồn từ sự thiếu dữ liệu cho cả việc người mẫu và đánh giá các giác quan hiếm trong các tập tin WSD hiện tại. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi giới thiệu FEWS (Vài shot Thí dụ về cảm xúc từ vựng), một tập tin WSD do dự bị tự động trích ra từ câu ví dụ ở Wiktlồ. Một tập tin lớn bao gồm các lĩnh vực ngôn ngữ tự nhiên khác nhau và cung cấp: 1) một bộ tập tin lớn bao gồm nhiều giác quan hơn nhiều các tập tin trước và 2) một bộ đánh giá đầy đủ chứa vài trường hợp không quay về các giác quan khác nhau. Chúng tôi thiết lập các đường cơ bản của FEWS với phương pháp WSD dựa trên kiến thức và thần kinh, và thí nghiệm chuyển nhượng này cho thấy các mẫu được huấn luyện thêm với FEWS nắm bắt tốt hơn các giác quan hiếm trong tập tin WSD hiện tại. Cuối cùng, chúng ta tìm thấy con người vượt trội hơn những mô hình cơ bản tốt nhất trên FEWS, ngụ ý rằng FEWS sẽ hỗ trợ công việc tương lai quan trọng với WSD thất bại.', 'uz': "Name @ info Bu qogʻozda biz FEWS (Soʻz Sensorning kichkina misollari), Wiktionary bir misol uchun yangi WSD maʼlumot setini avtomatik olib tashlash. FEWS asl tilning tarkibi tarkibida juda qiymati bor va ishlatiladi: (1) oldingi maʼlumotlar sonlaridan ko'p sensonlarni qaraydigan katta ta'lim moslama va (2) bir necha- va ko'plab sensonlarning turli misollarida qiymatlar mavjud. Biz Aʼlum va neural WSD murakkablari bilan FEWS asosiy asosini qo'llamiz va hozir o'rganish imkoniyatlarini o'rganish imkoniyatlarini hozir qilamiz. Bu modellar FEWS bilan qo'shimcha o'rganish modellari mavjud WSD maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi qisqa sensonlarni olib tas Endi biz odamlar FEWS'ning eng yaxshi asosiy modellarini ko'rganamiz va FEWS kamaytirish WSD'da muhim kelajakdagi ishni qoʻllamaydi.", 'hr': 'Trenutni modeli za Disambiguaciju osjećaja rijetkih čula bore se za disambiguaciju rijetkih čula, uprkos postizanju ljudskog učinka na globalne WSD metrike. To je zbog nedostatka podataka za modeliranje i procjenu rijetkih čula u postojećim WSD podacima. U ovom papiru predstavljamo FEWS (primjere osjećaja riječi) novi nizak snimak WSD podataka automatski izvučen iz primjernih rečenica u Wiktionaryju. FEWS ima visok osjećaj prekrivanja u različitim prirodnim jezičkim domenama i pruža: (1) veliku obuku koja pokriva mnoge više čula od prethodnih seta podataka i (2) sveobuhvatnu procjenu koja sadrži nekoliko primjera širokih raznih čula. Postavljamo osnovne linije na FEWS-u s pristupima na znanju i neuralnim WSD-ima i predstavljamo eksperimente o učenju prijenosa koji pokazuju da su modeli dodatno obučeni FEWS-om bolje uhvatiti rijetke čule u postojećim WSD datasetima. Na kraju, pronašli smo ljude kako izvršavaju najbolje osnovne modele na FEWS-u, ukazujući na to da će FEWS podržati značajan budući rad na niskom pucnjavi WSD-u.', 'bg': 'Съвременните модели за дисамбигуация на чувството на словото (WSD) се борят да разграничат редките сетива, въпреки че достигат човешки резултати по глобалните показатели на WSD. Това произтича от липсата на данни както за моделиране, така и за оценяване на редки сетива в съществуващите набори от данни. В тази статия представяме нов набор от данни с нисък кадър автоматично извлечен от примерни изречения в Уикиречник. FEWS има високо сетивно покритие в различни области на естествения език и предоставя: (1) голям набор от обучения, който обхваща много повече сетива от предишните набори от данни и (2) цялостен набор от оценки, съдържащ няколко и нулеви примери за голямо разнообразие от сетива. Ние установяваме базови линии на ФУС с базирани на знанието и неврални подходи и представяме експерименти с трансферно обучение, демонстриращи, че модели, допълнително обучени с ФУС, по-добре улавят редки сетива в съществуващите набори от данни за ФУС. И накрая, откриваме, че хората са по-добри от най-добрите базови модели на ФЕWS, което показва, че ФЕWS ще подкрепят значителна бъдеща работа по ниско ниво на WSD.', 'nl': 'Huidige modellen voor Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) worstelen om zeldzame zintuigen te verduidelijken, ondanks het bereiken van menselijke prestaties op wereldwijde WSD-statistieken. Dit komt voort uit een gebrek aan gegevens voor zowel het modelleren als het evalueren van zeldzame zintuigen in bestaande WSD datasets. In dit artikel introduceren we FEWS (Few-shot Examples of Word Senses), een nieuwe low-shot WSD dataset die automatisch wordt geëxtraheerd uit voorbeeldzinnen in Wiktionary. FEWS heeft een hoge zintuigdekking over verschillende natuurlijke taaldomeinen en biedt: (1) een grote trainingsset die veel meer zintuigen bestrijkt dan eerdere datasets en (2) een uitgebreide evaluatieset met weinig en zero-shot voorbeelden van een breed scala aan zintuigen. We stellen baselines op FEWS vast met kennis-gebaseerde en neurale WSD benaderingen en presenteren transfer learning experimenten die aantonen dat modellen die bovendien met FEWS zijn getraind, zeldzame zintuigen beter vangen in bestaande WSD datasets. Tot slot vinden we dat mensen beter presteren dan de beste baseline modellen op FEWS, wat aangeeft dat FEWS significant toekomstig werk aan low-shot WSD zal ondersteunen.', 'da': 'De nuværende modeller for Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) kæmper for at adskille sjældne sanser på trods af at de nåede menneskelige resultater på globale WSD-målinger. Dette skyldes manglende data til både modellering og evaluering af sjældne sanser i eksisterende WSD datasæt. I denne artikel introducerer vi FEWS (Few-shot Exemples of Word Senses), et nyt low-shot WSD datasæt, der automatisk udtrækkes fra eksempelssætninger i Wiktionary. FEWS har høj sanse dækning på tværs af forskellige natursprogdomæner og giver: (1) et stort træningssæt, der dækker mange flere sanser end tidligere datasæt og (2) et omfattende evalueringssæt, der indeholder få og nulskud eksempler på en bred vifte af sanser. Vi etablerer baselines på FEWS med videnbaserede og neurale WSD tilgange og præsenterer transfer learning eksperimenter, der viser, at modeller yderligere trænet med FEWS bedre fanger sjældne sanser i eksisterende WSD datasæt. Endelig finder vi, at mennesker overgår de bedste basismodeller på FEWS, hvilket indikerer, at FEWS vil støtte betydeligt fremtidigt arbejde på lavt skud WSD.', 'de': 'Aktuelle Modelle für Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) haben Schwierigkeiten, seltene Sinne zu verdeutlichen, obwohl sie die menschliche Leistung bei globalen WSD-Metriken erreichen. Dies beruht auf einem Mangel an Daten für die Modellierung und Bewertung seltener Sinne in bestehenden WSD-Datensätzen. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir FEWS (Few-shot Examples of Word Senses) vor, einen neuen Low-Shot WSD Datensatz, der automatisch aus Beispielsätzen in Wiktionary extrahiert wird. FEWS hat eine hohe Sinnesabdeckung über verschiedene natürliche Sprachdomänen und bietet: (1) einen großen Trainingssatz, der viel mehr Sinne abdeckt als vorherige Datensätze und (2) einen umfassenden Evaluationssatz mit wenigen und Null-Schuss-Beispielen einer Vielzahl von Sinnen. Wir etablieren Grundlagen auf FEWS mit wissensbasierten und neuronalen WSD-Ansätzen und präsentieren Transferlernexperimente, die zeigen, dass Modelle, die zusätzlich mit FEWS trainiert werden, seltene Sinne in bestehenden WSD-Datensätzen besser erfassen. Schließlich stellen wir fest, dass Menschen die besten Basismodelle auf FEWS übertreffen, was darauf hindeutet, dass FEWS bedeutende zukünftige Arbeiten an low-shot WSD unterstützen wird.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای فعلی برای تغییر فعالیت Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) با وجود رسیدن به عملکرد انسان در متریک جهانی WSD می\u200cجنگند. این از ناتوانی داده ها برای مدل کردن و ارزیابی حس نادر در مجموعه داده های WSD موجود است. در این کاغذ، ما FEWS را معرفی می\u200cکنیم (مثالهای کمی از احساسات کلمات) یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای پایین WSD از جمله\u200cهای مثال در ویکتیواری خارج شده است. FEWS در زمینه\u200cهای طبیعی مختلف پوشش حس بالا دارد و پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد: (۱) یک مجموعه آموزش بزرگی که بیشتر از مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای قبلی را پوشش می\u200cدهد و (۲) یک ارزیابی کامل که شامل نمونه\u200cهای کمی و صفر از مجموعه\u200cهای مختلف حس است. ما خطوط بنیادی روی FEWS را با دسترسی به علم و عصبی WSD و آزمایش یادگیری انتقال را در حال حاضر ایجاد می کنیم که مدل اضافه به FEWS آموزش داده شده بهتر است حس نادر را در مجموعه داده های WSD موجود بگیرد. بالاخره، ما انسان\u200cها را از بهترین مدل\u200cهای پایین\u200cخط روی FEWS می\u200cیابیم، نشان می\u200cدهیم که FEWS به کار های آینده\u200cای بزرگ بر روی WSD\u200cهای پایین حمایت می\u200cکند.', 'ko': '현재의 의미 소멸(WSD) 모델은 전 세계 WSD 지표에서 인간의 표현에 도달했음에도 불구하고 희귀한 의미의 의미를 없애기 어렵다.이는 기존 WSD 데이터세트에 모델링과 희귀 감각을 평가하는 데이터가 부족한 데서 비롯됐다.본고에서 우리는 FEWS(의미의 소수 렌즈 예시)를 소개했는데 이것은 새로운 저렌즈 WSD 데이터 집합으로 WikTiorary의 예시 문장에서 자동으로 추출된다.FEWS는 서로 다른 자연 언어 분야에서 매우 높은 감각적 커버율을 가지고 있다. (1) 이전의 데이터 집합보다 더 많은 감각을 커버하는 대형 훈련 집합, (2) 각종 감각을 포함하는 소량과 0차례의 예시를 포함하는 종합 평가 집합을 제공한다.우리는 지식과 신경을 바탕으로 하는 WSD 방법을 사용하여 FEWS의 기선을 구축하고 이동 학습 실험을 실시하여 FEWS 추가 훈련 모델을 사용하면 기존 WSD 데이터가 집중된 희귀 감각을 더욱 잘 포착할 수 있음을 증명하였다.마지막으로 우리는 인류가 FEWS에서의 활약이 최상의 기선 모델보다 우수하다는 것을 발견했다. 이것은 FEWS가 앞으로 저사거리 WSD 분야의 중요한 업무를 지원할 것이라는 것을 나타낸다.', 'sw': 'Mradi wa sasa kwa ajili ya Ukumbuzi wa Sensi (WSD) unapambana na kutangaza hisia za nadra, pamoja na kufikia utendaji wa binadamu kwenye mbinu za WSD duniani. Hii inatokana na ukosefu wa taarifa kwa ajili ya kutengeneza na kutathmini hisia za nadra katika seti za taarifa za WSD zilizopo. Katika gazeti hili, tunautambulisha FEWS (Mifano michache ya Sensi), taarifa mpya ya WSD inayopigwa na risasi ya kudharauliwa kwa urahisi kutoka kwenye hukumu za mfano huko Wiktionary. FEWS ana taarifa kubwa za maana katika maeneo mbalimbali ya lugha za asili na inatoa: (1) seti kubwa ya mafunzo ambayo inazungumzia hisia nyingi zaidi ya seti za takwimu zilizopita na (2) kituo cha tathmini kinachohusu mifano michache na sifuri ya hisia mbalimbali. Tunaweza kuanzisha misingi ya FEWS yenye mbinu za WSD yenye ufahamu na uhakika na sasa za kusafirisha elimu zinazoonyesha kuwa mifano imefundishwa zaidi na FEWS inaweza kupata hisia chache katika seti za taarifa za WSD zilizopo. Mwisho, tunakuta binadamu wanafanya mifano bora ya msingi kwenye FEWS, ikionyesha kwamba FEWS itaunga mkono kazi muhimu ya baadaye kwenye WSD yenye risasi ya chini.', 'tr': "Häzirki modler söz Sense Inbaglançylygy (WSD) dünýä WSD metriýasynda adamlaryň başaryşlaryny ýetmegine rağmen çözýärler. Bu hem modelleşdirmek üçin ýagdaý duýgular ýok hasaplamakdan däldir. Bu kagyzda FEWS'i (Wiktionary'da ýakyn atly sözleriniň örnekleri) tanyşdyrýarys. FEWS üýtgeşik diller arasynda görnüş duýgulary bar we şol sebäpli: (1) öňki sanat setirlerinden köp duýgulary örän köp duýgulary we (2) birnäçe duýgularyň birnäçe- we zerw atly eserlerini bar. FEWS üzerinde bilim tabanlı ve nöral WSD yaklaşımları ile temel hatlary oluşturuyoruz ve şu anda, FEWS ile ek şekilde eğitilen modellerin, bar WSD veri setlerinde nadir duyguları elde etmesi gerektiğini gösteriyoruz. Sonunda insanlar FEWS'deki en iyi temel modellerinin gelecekteki işi düşük derecede destekleyeceğini gösteriyor.", 'af': "Huidige modele vir Woord Sense Disambiguation Hierdie stem van 'n mislukking van data vir beide modellering en evalueer rare senses in bestaande WSD datastelle. In hierdie papier, introduseer ons FEWS (min- shot voorbeelde van Woord Senses),  'n nuwe lae- skoot WSD datastel outomaties uitgevoer van voorbeeld setings in Wiktionary. FEWS het hoë sens omdekking oor verskillende natuurlike taal domeine en verskaf: (1) ' n groot onderwerp stel wat bedek baie meer senses as vorige datastelle en (2) ' n komprehensiewe evaluering stel bevat paar- en nul- skoot voorbeelde van 'n wyde verskillende senses. Ons stel basisline op FEWS met kennis-gebaseerde en neurale WSD toegang en voorneem oordrag leer eksperimente wat wys dat modele addisioneel opgelei het met FEWS beter opneem rare senses in bestaande WSD datastelle. Eindelik vind ons mense uit die beste basisline modele op FEWS uitvoer, aanduidelik dat FEWS betekende toekomstige werk op lae-skoot WSD ondersteun sal word.", 'sq': 'Modelet aktuale për zhdukjen e ndjenjave të fjalëve (WSD) luftojnë për të çambiguar ndjenjat e rralla, pavarësisht nga arritja e performancës njerëzore në metrikat globale të WSD. Kjo vjen nga mungesa e të dhënave për modelimin dhe vlerësimin e ndjenjave të rralla në të dhënat ekzistuese të WSD. Në këtë letër, ne prezantojmë FEWS (shembuj pak-fotografish të ndjenjave të fjalëve), një set të ri të dhënash të vogla WSD të nxjerrë automatikisht nga shembuj fjalësh në Wiktionary. FEWS ka mbulim të madh të kuptimeve nëpërmjet domeneve të ndryshme të gjuhës natyrore dhe ofron: (1) një grup trajnimi të madh që mbulon shumë më shumë ndjeje se të dhënat e mëparshme dhe (2) një grup vlerësimi të përgjithshëm që përmban shembuj të paktë dhe zero-shot të një shumicë të gjerë të ndjenjave. Ne vendosim linja bazë në FEWS me qasje të bazuara në njohuri dhe në WSD nervore dhe prezantojmë eksperimente mësimi transferues që demonstrojnë se modelet shtesë të trajnuar me FEWS kapin më mirë ndjenja të rralla në grupet ekzistuese të të dhënave WSD. Më në fund, gjejmë se njerëzit ekzistojnë modelet më të mira bazë në FEWS, duke treguar se FEWS do të mbështesë punën e rëndësishme të ardhshme në WSD me mundësi të ulët.', 'am': 'የአሁኑ የቃላት ሰንሲን አፍላጻ (WSD) ምሳሌዎች ሰብዓዊ WSD ሚትርኮች ላይ ምንም እንኳ ቢደርስ ንጹሕ ስውተቶችን ለማፍሰስ ይጋደላሉ፡፡ ይህ አካላዊ ዳታዎችን በመግለጽ እና በአገኘው WSD ዳታተሮች ውስጥ ትንሽ እውቀትን ለማስተዋል ከዳታ ጎድለበት ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም FEWS (የቃላት ምሳሌዎች የሳንሱን ምሳሌ) እናስታውቃለን፡፡ FEWS በተለየ ቋንቋ ውስጥ በተለየ ቋንቋዎች ግንኙነት ላይ ከፍ ያለ ማስተዋል አለበት:(1) በተለየ ልዩ ዓይነቶች ላይ ከቀድሞው ዳታተሮች ይልቅ ብዙ እውቀትን የሚሸፍኑት ትምህርት ማድረጊያውን እና (2) የተለየ ጥቂት እና የzero-shot ምሳሌዎችን የሚሸፍኑት ጥቅረት ማድረግ ነው፡፡ በአውቀት እና የደዌብ WSD መቃወሚያ እና የአሁኑ ትምህርት ተማሪ ፈተና እና ምሳሌዎችን በተጨማሪም የFEWS ዓይነቶች በአገኘው የWSD ዳታተሮች ውስጥ ትንሽ ትንሽ እውቀትን ማግኘት እናስታውቃለን፡፡ በመጨረሻውም FEWS በሚያሳየው የበለጠ የደረጃ መተላለፊያ ሞላዎችን የሚያደርጉ ሰዎች እናገኛለን፡፡ FEWS ትንሹ የውጤት የWSD ውጤት የሚደረገውን ትልቅ ሥራ እንዲደግፍ እናስታውቃለን፡፡', 'bn': 'বিশ্বব্যাপী উইএসডি মেট্রিকে মানুষের প্রদর্শনের কাছে পৌঁছানোর সত্ত্বেও বর্তমান মডেল বিভ্রান্তিকর বিভ্রান্তিকর অনুভূতির জন্য This stems from a lack of data for both modeling and evaluating rare senses in existing WSD datasets.  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা FEWS (কয়েকটি শব্দ সেন্সের উদাহরণ) পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি। উইক্টনেরীতে একটি নতুন কম-শট ডাটাসেট ডাটাসেট স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে উৎপা এফইউএসের প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার ডোমেন্টে বিভিন্ন প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার কাভারেজ রয়েছে এবং তা প্রদান করেছে: (১) একটি প্রশিক্ষণ সেট যা পূর্ববর্তী ডাটাসেটের চেয়ে অনেক অনে আমরা জ্ঞান ভিত্তিক এবং নিউরেল উইএসডি প্রবেশের মাধ্যমে এফএউএস-এর উপর নেটলাইন স্থাপন করি এবং বর্তমানে শিক্ষা পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা দিয়ে বর্তমানে প্রদর্শন করি যে এফএউএস-এর মো শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা মানুষ ফেইউএস-এর সবচেয়ে ভালো বেসাইলাইন মডেল প্রকাশ করে দেখতে পাচ্ছি, যেখানে নির্দেশ দেয়া হচ্ছে যে FEWS নিম্ন গুরু', 'hy': 'Բառերի զգացմունքների բացահայտության ներկայիս մոդելները պայքարում են հազվադեպ զգացմունքների բացահայտելու համար, չնայած մարդկային արտադրողություններին հասնելու համաշխարհային աշխարհային զգացմունքների չափերի վրա: Սա պատճառով է, որ տեղեկատվությունը բացակայում է, ինչպես մոդելների, ինչպես նաև հազվադեպ զգացմունքների գնահատման համար գոյություն ունեցող համակարգերում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք ՖԵՎՍ (Բառերի զգացմունքների մի քանի նկարների օրինակներ), նոր ցածր պատկերված ՎԻՍԴ տվյալների համակարգ, որը ինքնաբերաբար դուրս է գալիս Wikipedia օրինակի նախադասություններից: ՖԵՎՍ-ն ունի բարձր զգացմունքներ տարբեր բնական լեզվի ոլորտներում և պարունակում է: (1) մեծ վարժությունների համակարգ, որը ներառում է ավելի շատ զգացմունքներ, քան նախորդ տվյալների համակարգը և (2) ընդհանուր գնահատման համակարգ, որը պարունակում է բազմաթիվ Մենք ստեղծում ենք հիմնական գծեր ՖԵՎՍ-ի վրա գիտելիքներով հիմնված և նյարդային ՀՀՍ-ի մոտեցումներով և ներկայացնում ենք փոխանցման ուսումնական փորձարկումներ, որոնք ցույց են տալիս, որ ֆԵՎՍ-ի միջոցով ավելին վարժեցված մոդելները ավելի լավ են ըն Վերջապես, մենք հայտնաբերեցինք, որ մարդիկ գերազանցում են ամենալավ հիմքային մոդելները, որոնք ցույց են տալիս, որ հիմքային մոդելները կօգնեն ապագայի նշանակալի աշխատանքը ցածր աշխատանքի վրա:', 'az': "Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) modelləri küresel WSD metriklərində insan performansına gəlməyə baxmayaraq, nadir hissləri dəyişdirmək üçün mübahisə edirlər. Bu, mövcud WSD veri qurğuları içində modelləşdirmək və çətin duyguları üçün verilən məlumat yoxdur. Bu kağızda FEWS'i tanıdırıq (Few-shot Word Senses Misal), Wiktionary'da nümunəlik cümlələrdən avtomatik çıxarılan yeni düşük WSD veri qutusu. FEWS müxtəlif təbiətli dil sahələrində yüksək duygu örtükləri var və təmin edir: : Elm və nöral WSD yaxınlıqları ilə FEWS ilə əsas çətinləri təyin edirik və transfer öyrənməsi təcrübələrini göstərdik ki, FEWS ilə daha çox öyrənmiş modellər daha çox nadir hissləri daha yaxınlaşdırır. Sonunda, insanların FEWS-in ən yaxşı sətir modellərini daha üstün edəcəyini görürük, FEWS-in düşük sətir WSD-nin möhkəm gələcək işlərini dəstəkləyəcəyini göstərir.", 'id': 'Model saat ini untuk Disambiguation Sense Word (WSD) berjuang untuk disambiguate senses langka, meskipun mencapai prestasi manusia pada metrik WSD global. This stems from a lack of data for both modeling and evaluating rare senses in existing WSD datasets.  Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan FEWS (contoh-contoh beberapa gambar dari Senses Word), sebuah set data WSD yang baru dengan gambar rendah secara otomatis diekstraksi dari kalimat contoh di Wiktionary. FEWS memiliki penutupan sensor tinggi di berbagai daerah bahasa alam dan menyediakan: (1) set pelatihan besar yang meliputi banyak sensor lebih dari set data sebelumnya dan (2) set evaluasi komprensif yang mengandung beberapa contoh- dan zero-shot dari berbagai sensor lebar. Kami mendirikan garis dasar pada FEWS dengan pendekatan WSD berbasis pengetahuan dan saraf dan menghasilkan eksperimen belajar transfer yang menunjukkan bahwa model yang dilatih tambahan dengan FEWS lebih baik menangkap sens langka dalam set data WSD yang ada. Finally, we find humans outperform the best baseline models on FEWS, indicating that FEWS will support significant future work on low-shot WSD.', 'bs': 'Trenutni modeli za Disambiguaciju rijetkih čula (WSD) bore se za disambiguaciju rijetkih čula, uprkos postizanju ljudskog učinka na globalne WSD metrike. To je zbog nedostatka podataka za modeliranje i procjenu retkih čula u postojećim WSD datasetima. U ovom papiru predstavljamo FEWS (Primjer osjećaja riječi, novi nizak snimak WSD podataka automatski izvlačen iz primjernih rečenica u Wiktionaryju. FEWS ima visoko smisla preko različitih prirodnih jezičkih domena i pruža: (1) veliku obuku koja pokriva mnoge više čula od prethodnih seta podataka i (2) sveobuhvatnu procjenu koja sadrži neke primjere široke razne čula. Postavljamo osnovne linije na FEWS-u s pristupima na znanju i neuralnim WSD-ima i predstavljamo eksperimente o učenju prijenosa koji pokazuju da su modeli dodatno obučeni FEWS-om bolje uhvatiti rijetke čule u postojećim WSD datasetima. Na kraju, pronašli smo ljude kako izvršavaju najbolje osnovne modele na FEWS-u, ukazujući na to da će FEWS podržati značajan budući rad na niskom pucnjavi WSD-u.', 'et': 'Praegused mudelid Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) ei suuda eristada haruldasi meeli, vaatamata inimeste jõudlusele globaalsete WSD mõõdikute osas. See tuleneb andmete puudumisest olemasolevates WSD andmekogumites nii haruldaste meelte modelleerimiseks kui ka hindamiseks. Selles töös tutvustame FEWS (Few-shot Exemples of Word Senses), uut madala võimsusega WSD andmekogumit, mis on automaatselt ekstraheeritud Wiktsionary näidislausetest. FEWS-il on erinevates looduskeele valdkondades kõrge meelteulatus ja see pakub: (1) suurt koolituskomplekti, mis hõlmab palju rohkem meeli kui varasemad andmekogumid, ja (2) põhjalikku hindamiskomplekti, mis sisaldab vähe- ja nullkatse näiteid paljudest meeltest. Me loome FEWS-idele alusjooned teadmistepõhiste ja neuraalsete WSD-meetoditega ning esitame siirdeõppe katseid, mis näitavad, et FEWS-idega täiendavalt koolitatud mudelid kajastavad paremini haruldasi meeli olemasolevates WSD-andmekogumites. Lõpuks leiame, et inimesed ületavad FEWS-i parimaid baasmudeleid, mis näitab, et FEWS-i toetab tulevikus olulist tööd madala lasuga WSD-ga.', 'ca': "Els models actuals de desambiguació del sentit de les paraules (WSD) lluiten per desambiguar els sentits rars, malgrat arribar al rendiment humà en les mètriques globals d'WSD. Això prové d'una falta de dades tant per modelar com per avaluar sentits rars en conjunts de dades existents sobre SDD. En aquest article introduïm FEWS (exemples de pocs exemples de sentits de paraules), un nou conjunt de dades WSD de baixa fotografia extraït automàticament d'exemples de frases a Wiktionary. FEWS té una gran cobertura de sentits en diferents dominys de llenguatge natural i proporciona: (1) un gran conjunt d'entrenaments que cobre molts més sentits que els anteriors conjunts de dades i (2) un conjunt d'evaluació completa que conté pocs exemples de fotografies zero d'una gran varietat de sentits. Establecem línies de referència sobre FEWS amb enfocaments basats en coneixements i neuronals de WSD i presentem experiments d'aprenentatge de transfer ència que demostren que models adicionalment entrenats amb FEWS tenen millor sentits rars en conjunts de dades existents sobre WSD. Finalment, trobem que els humans superen els millors models de base en FEWS, indicant que FEWS suportarà un treball futur significatiu en la desordenació mundial de baix nivells.", 'fi': 'Nykyiset Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) -mallit kamppailevat harvinaisten aistien erottamisessa toisistaan huolimatta siitä, että ne saavuttavat ihmisen suorituskyvyn globaaleissa WSD-mittareissa. Tämä johtuu siitä, että olemassa olevien WSD-aineistojen harvinaisten aistien mallintamiseen ja arviointiin ei ole riittävästi tietoa. Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme FEWS (Few-shot Exemples of Word Senses), uuden matalan kuvan WSD-aineiston, joka on automaattisesti poimittu Wiktionaryn esimerkkilauseista. FEWS:llä on suuri aistikattavuus eri luonnonkielialueilla ja se tarjoaa: (1) suuren harjoitussarjan, joka kattaa paljon enemmän aisteja kuin aikaisemmat aineistot, ja (2) kattavan arviointisarjan, joka sisältää muutamia ja nollakuvia esimerkkejä monista aisteista. Kehitämme FEWS-pohjaisia lähtölinjoja tietopohjaisilla ja neuraalisilla WSD-lähestymistavoilla ja esittelemme siirtooppimiskokeiluja, jotka osoittavat, että FEWS-tekniikalla koulutetut mallit tallentavat paremmin harvinaisia aisteja olemassa oleviin WSD-aineistoihin. Lopuksi toteamme, että ihmiset suoriutuvat paremmin kuin parhaat perusmallit FEWS:ssä, mikä osoittaa, että FEWS tukee merkittävää työtä matalan laukauksen WSD:ssä.', 'cs': 'Současné modely pro Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) se snaží rozjasnit vzácné smysly, navzdory dosažení lidské výkonnosti na globálních WSD metrikách. To vyplývá z nedostatku dat pro modelování i vyhodnocování vzácných smyslů ve stávajících WSD datových sadách. V tomto článku představujeme FEWS (Few-shot Examples of Word Senses), novou low-shot WSD datovou sadu automaticky extrahovanou z ukázkových vět ve Wiktionary. FEWS má vysoké pokrytí smyslů napříč různými přirozenými jazykovými doménami a poskytuje: (1) velkou školicí sadu, která pokrývá mnohem více smyslů než předchozí datové sady a (2) komplexní hodnotící sadu obsahující několik a nulových příkladů široké škály smyslů. Vytváříme základní linie na FEWS pomocí znalostních a neuronových WSD přístupů a představujeme experimenty transferového učení, které demonstrují, že modely navíc trénované s FEWS lépe zachycují vzácné smysly ve stávajících WSD datových sadách. Konečně zjišťujeme, že lidé překonávají nejlepší základní modely na FEWS, což naznačuje, že FEWS bude podporovat významnou budoucí práci na low-shot WSD.', 'sk': 'Trenutni modeli za razočaranje besednega smisla (WSD) se težko razjasnijo redke čute, kljub doseganju človeške uspešnosti na globalnih meritvah WSD. To izhaja iz pomanjkanja podatkov za modeliranje in ocenjevanje redkih čutil v obstoječih naborih podatkov WSD. V tem članku predstavljamo FEWS (Few-shot Exemples of Word Senses), nov niz podatkov WSD, ki so samodejno pridobljeni iz primerov stavkov v Wikislovarju. FEWS ima visoko čutilno pokritost na različnih področjih naravnega jezika in zagotavlja: (1) velik nabor usposabljanj, ki zajema veliko več čutov kot prejšnji nabor podatkov, in (2) celovit nabor ocenjevanja, ki vsebuje nekaj in ničelnih primerov različnih čutov. Vzpostavljamo osnovne linije na področju FEWS z znanjem temelječimi in nevronskimi pristopi WSD ter predstavljamo poskuse prenosnega učenja, ki dokazujejo, da modeli, ki so dodatno usposobljeni s FEWS, bolje zajemajo redke čute v obstoječih naborih podatkov WSD. Nazadnje smo ugotovili, da ljudje presegajo najboljše osnovne modele pri FEWS, kar kaže, da bo FEWS podprl pomembno prihodnje delo pri WSD z nizkimi streli.', 'ha': "Yin motdalun da ake kai yanzu wa Cikakken Size (WSD) yana ƙara wa su bambanci sauri, kuma kõ da ya kai ga aikin mutum a kan metric WSD na duniya. Wannan yana daga ƙaranci da data na samu masu motsari da kuma ana ƙaddara sauri cikin tsarin da ake ƙunsa da WSD. In this paper, we introduce FEWS (Few-shot Examples of Word Senses), a new low-shot WSD dataset automatically extracted from example sentences in Wiktionary.  FEWS yana da rufe sanki mai tsawo a kowace masu cikin harshen asili na farko kuma yana azurta shi: (1) wani tsari mai girma wanda ke rufe wasu sanyin masu yawa ko da tsarin danasãri na farko, da (2) an daidaita babban evaluation wanda yana da misãlai kaɗan- da sifire-shot na masu cikin zane-daban-daban. Mu ƙayyade salon FEWS da hanyõyin WSD a kan ilmi da neura, kuma masu samun transfer da amfani da yanzu, suna nuna misalin da aka yi wa amfani da FEWS mafi canza su sami sauri da sauri cikin tsarin da ke da WSD. Haƙĩƙa, Munã sãmu mutum mafiya ƙaranci misãlai masu ƙaranci a kan FEWS, kuma yana gaya cewa FEWS zai ƙarfafa aikin bayan da za'a yi sauna da shi.", 'jv': 'Validity Digawe Nang pepulan iki, kita nambah "KEWS" (Kemerdekaan \'Few-shot Samsul Kemerdekaan Word Senses\'), dataset sing isine uwong-nggo WSD kang automatik sing gagalah jutir mungkar mungkar mu tresnane ning Wiksionany " Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem basa sing nêmên karo "KEWS" sing basa awak dhéwé karo pawarang nêmên WSD kuwi nggawe nyimpen ijol-ijol nang ngerasai model sing nambah layang apik dhéwé karo "KEWS" sing luwih basa gambar uwong gawe dataset WSD dumadhi. Lha wih-wih, awak dhéwé nggawe barang-uwong kuwi model sing luwih dumadhi nêmên bakal nggawe "KEWS" iso nggawe barang kelas nêmên negoro lanjut cara nggo rebut WSD', 'he': 'Current models for Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) struggle to disambiguate rare senses, despite reaching human performance on global WSD metrics.  זה מגיע מחוסר נתונים גם לדוגמאות וגם להערכה חושים נדירים בתערוכות נתונים WSD קיימות. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים FEWS (דוגמאות קטנות של רגשות מילים), קבוצת מידע WSD חדשה עם צילום נמוך באופן אוטומטי מווצאת ממשפטים דוגמאים ב Wiktionary. FEWS יש כיסוי תחושה גבוה באזור שפת טבעי שונה ומספק: (1) קבוצת אימונים גדולה שמכילה הרבה יותר תחושות מאשר קבוצת נתונים קודמות (2) קבוצת עריכה מיוחדת שמכילה דוגמאות קטנות ואפס של מגוון רחב של תחושות. אנחנו מקבלים קווים בסיסיים על FEWS עם גישות מובססות על ידע ועצביות WSD ומציגים ניסויים לימוד העברה שמוכיחים כי דוגמנים באופן נוסף מאומנים עם FEWS לתפוס טוב יותר חושים נדירים בתוכניות מידע WSD קיימות. סוף סוף, אנו מוצאים שאנשים יוצאים מעל הדוגמנים הבסיסיים הטובים ביותר על FEWS, שמצביעים כי FEWS יתמוך בעבודה עתידית משמעותית על WSD ירי נמוך.', 'bo': 'Current models for Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) struggle to disambiguate rare senses, despite reaching human performance on global WSD metrics. འདིས་མ་དབྱིབས་སྟངས་དང་མཐུན་པས་རྩིས་ཅན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ཉམས་འཇུག་བྱེད་མི་ཐུབ་པ། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་FEWS(དཔེར་ན་(Word Senses)འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་དཔེར་བརྗོད་ཆེན་ཉུང་བའི་WSD གནད་སྡུད་གཞི་ཚོགས་སྒྲིག་ཉེན་པ་ཞིག་ནི་ FEWS has high sense coverage across different natural language domains and provides: (1) a large training set that covers many more senses than previous datasets and (2) a comprehensive evaluation set containing few- and zero-shot examples of a wide variety of senses. We establish baselines on FEWS with knowledge-based and neural WSD approaches and present transfer learning experiments demonstrating that models additionally trained with FEWS better capture rare senses in existing WSD datasets. མཐའ་མཇུག་དུ། ང་ཚོར་མི་མང་གི་རྨང་གཞིའི་མིག་དཔེ་གཟུགས་རིས་ལྡན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དེ་ནི་FEWS(FEWS)ནང་གི་མ་འོངས་ལྡ'}
{'en': 'MONAH : Multi-Modal Narratives for Humans to analyze conversations', 'ar': 'منى: روايات متعددة الوسائط للبشر لتحليل المحادثات', 'es': 'MONAH: Narrativas multimodales para que los humanos analicen conversaciones', 'pt': 'MONAH: Narrativas multimodais para humanos para analisar conversas', 'fr': "MONAH\xa0: Des récits multimodaux pour les humains afin d'analyser les conversations", 'ja': 'MONAH:人間が会話を分析するためのマルチモーダルナラティブ', 'hi': 'मोनाह: वार्तालापों का विश्लेषण करने के लिए मनुष्यों के लिए मल्टी-मोडल नैरेटिव्स', 'zh': 'MONAH曰:人言多模态叙事', 'ru': 'MONAH: Мультимодальные нарративы для людей для анализа разговоров', 'ga': 'MONAH: Narratives Ilmhódúla do Dhaoine chun anailís a dhéanamh ar chomhráite', 'ka': 'MONAH: მრავალური მოდიალური ნარატივები ადამიანებისთვის საუბარის ანალიზაცია', 'el': 'Πολυmodale αφηγήσεις για τους ανθρώπους για να αναλύσουν συζητήσεις', 'hu': 'MONAH: Multi-Modális narratívák az embereknek, hogy elemezzék a beszélgetéseket', 'it': 'MONAH: Narrative multimodali per gli umani per analizzare le conversazioni', 'lt': 'MONAH: Daugiamoduliai narkotikai žmonėms, skirti analizuoti pokalbius', 'mk': 'Мултимодални наративи за луѓето за анализирање на разговорите', 'kk': 'MONAH: Адамдар үшін көптеген модалдық нарративтер сөйлесуді талдау үшін', 'ms': 'MONAH: Narrative Multi-Modal bagi Manusia untuk menganalisis perbualan', 'ml': 'മനുഷ്യരുടെ സംസാരം അന്വേഷിക്കാനുള്ള പല-മോഡല്\u200d നാറ്ററിവുകള്\u200d', 'mt': 'MONAH: Narrativi Multi-Modali għall-Bniedem biex janalizzaw il-konverżjonijiet', 'mn': 'MONAH: Хүн төрөлхтний олон загварын нарийвчлал ярианы талаар', 'pl': 'MONAH: Wielomodalne narracje dla ludzi do analizy rozmów', 'no': 'MONAH: Fleirmodal narrativ for menneske for å analysera samtaler', 'ro': 'MONAH: Narative Multi-Modale pentru oameni pentru a analiza conversațiile', 'sr': 'MONAH: Multimodalni Narrativi za ljude da analiziraju razgovore', 'sv': 'MONAH: Multi-Modal Narratives för människor att analysera samtal', 'si': 'MONAH: මිනිස්සුන්ට සමාව විශ්ලේෂ කරන්න ගොඩක් මෝඩාල් නරේටිවල්', 'so': 'MONAH: Narrayaal kala duduwan ee dadka si ay u analysaan hadallada', 'ta': 'மோனாஹ்: மனிதர்களுக்கான பல- மாதிரி விளக்கங்களை ஆய்வு செய்ய', 'ur': 'MONAH: انسانوں کے لئے بہت سی موڈال ناراریٹ کی باتوں کا تحلیل کرنے کے لئے', 'uz': 'MONAH: Суҳбатларни таҳлил қилиш учун одамлар учун кўп модейлик тарқатувчилар', 'vi': 'Các giới tính phức tạp cho nhân loại phân tích cuộc nói chuyện', 'bg': 'Мултимодални разкази за хората, за да анализират разговорите', 'da': 'MONAH: Multi-Modal Fortællinger for mennesker til at analysere samtaler', 'de': 'MONAH: Multimodale Narrative für Menschen zur Analyse von Gesprächen', 'ko': 'MONAH: 인간 분석 대화의 다중모드 서사', 'nl': 'MONAH: Multimodale Narratieven voor mensen om gesprekken te analyseren', 'hr': 'MONAH: Multimodalni Narrativi za ljude za analizu razgovora', 'sw': 'MONAH: Wanachambua majadiliano mengi kwa ajili ya binadamu kuchambua mazungumzo', 'tr': 'MONAH: İnsanlar için çok Modal Narratives konuşmaları analiz etmek için', 'id': 'Multi-Modal Narratives for Humans to analyze conversations', 'fa': 'MONAH: Narratives Multimodal for Humans to analyze conversations', 'sq': 'Narrativa multimodale për njerëzit për të analizuar bisedimet', 'af': 'MONAH: Multimodal Narratives vir mense om gesprekke te analiseer', 'hy': 'ՄՕՆԱՀ. Մարդկանց համար բազմամոդելային պատմություններ վերլուծելու համար', 'bn': 'মোনাহ: আলোচনা বিশ্লেষণ করার জন্য মানুষের জন্য বহুমাত্র মডেল ন্যারেটিভ', 'am': 'ማህጆ: የንግግርን ለማስተዋል ለሰዎች የብዙ ሞዴል አቀማመጥ', 'az': 'MONAH: İnsanlar üçün çox Modal Narratives danışmalarını analiz etmək üçün', 'bs': 'MONAH: Multimodalni Narrativi za ljude za analizu razgovora', 'ca': 'MONAH: Narratius multimòdics per als humans per analitzar converses', 'et': 'MONAH: Multimodaalsed jutustused inimestele vestluste analüüsimiseks', 'cs': 'MONAH: Multimodální vyprávění pro lidi k analýze konverzací', 'fi': 'MONAH: Monimodaalisia kertomuksia ihmisille keskustelujen analysoimiseksi', 'jv': 'MONOH: Multi-modal Narrate kanggo Ketok Ngubah', 'bo': 'MONAH: ཆོས་རིགས་མི་མང་ཆེ་མཐོང་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ལ་གཏོང་གླེང་མོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ', 'ha': 'MANA: Babu Narrarrarrative masu yawa na Motsi dõmin ya yi anayyar da mazaɓa', 'sk': 'MONAH: Večmodalne pripovedi za ljudi za analizo pogovorov', 'he': 'סיפורים רבים מודליים עבור בני אדם כדי לנתח שיחות'}
{'en': 'In conversational analyses, humans manually weave multimodal information into the transcripts, which is significantly time-consuming. We introduce a system that automatically expands the verbatim transcripts of video-recorded conversations using multimodal data streams. This system uses a set of preprocessing rules to weave multimodal annotations into the verbatim transcripts and promote interpretability. Our feature engineering contributions are two-fold : firstly, we identify the range of multimodal features relevant to detect rapport-building ; secondly, we expand the range of multimodal annotations and show that the expansion leads to statistically significant improvements in detecting rapport-building.', 'ar': 'في تحليلات المحادثة ، ينسج البشر يدويًا معلومات متعددة الوسائط في النصوص ، وهو ما يستغرق وقتًا طويلاً بشكل كبير. نقدم نظامًا يقوم تلقائيًا بتوسيع النصوص الحرفية للمحادثات المسجلة بالفيديو باستخدام تدفقات البيانات متعددة الوسائط. يستخدم هذا النظام مجموعة من قواعد المعالجة المسبقة لنسخ التعليقات التوضيحية متعددة الوسائط في النصوص الحرفية وتعزيز القابلية للتفسير. إن مساهماتنا في هندسة الميزات ذات شقين: أولاً ، نحدد نطاق الميزات متعددة الوسائط ذات الصلة باكتشاف بناء العلاقات ؛ ثانيًا ، نقوم بتوسيع نطاق التعليقات التوضيحية متعددة الوسائط ونبين أن التوسع يؤدي إلى تحسينات مهمة إحصائيًا في اكتشاف بناء العلاقات.', 'pt': 'Em análises de conversação, os humanos tecem manualmente informações multimodais nas transcrições, o que consome muito tempo. Apresentamos um sistema que expande automaticamente as transcrições literais de conversas gravadas em vídeo usando fluxos de dados multimodais. Este sistema usa um conjunto de regras de pré-processamento para tecer anotações multimodais nas transcrições literais e promover a interpretabilidade. Nossas contribuições de engenharia de recursos são duplas: primeiro, identificamos a variedade de recursos multimodais relevantes para detectar a construção de relacionamento; em segundo lugar, expandimos a gama de anotações multimodais e mostramos que a expansão leva a melhorias estatisticamente significativas na detecção de construção de rapport.', 'fr': "Dans les analyses conversationnelles, les humains intègrent manuellement des informations multimodales dans les transcriptions, ce qui prend beaucoup de temps. Nous introduisons un système qui étend automatiquement les transcriptions textuelles des conversations enregistrées par vidéo à l'aide de flux de données multimodaux. Ce système utilise un ensemble de règles de prétraitement pour intégrer des annotations multimodales dans les transcriptions textuelles et favoriser l'interprétabilité. Nos contributions à l'ingénierie des fonctionnalités sont doubles\xa0: premièrement, nous identifions la gamme de caractéristiques multimodales pertinentes pour détecter la création de rapports\xa0; deuxièmement, nous élargissons la gamme d'annotations multimodales et montrons que cette expansion conduit à des améliorations statistiquement significatives dans la détection de la création de rapports.", 'es': 'En los análisis conversacionales, los humanos entretejen manualmente información multimodal en las transcripciones, lo que lleva mucho tiempo. Introducimos un sistema que amplía automáticamente las transcripciones literales de las conversaciones grabadas en vídeo mediante flujos de datos multimodales. Este sistema utiliza un conjunto de reglas de preprocesamiento para integrar anotaciones multimodales en las transcripciones literales y promover la interpretabilidad. Nuestras contribuciones de ingeniería de características son dobles: en primer lugar, identificamos la gama de características multimodales relevantes para detectar la creación de relaciones; en segundo lugar, ampliamos la gama de anotaciones multimodales y mostramos que la expansión conduce a mejoras estadísticamente significativas en la detección de la creación de relaciones.', 'zh': '凡人手动将多模态息织于成绩单,甚耗时。 引入一统,宜用多模式数据流自广视频录制语逐字记。 其统用一组预处理则将多模式注织成逐字录,并促进可解释性。 功贡重矣:先定于检多式联运; 其次,我们广大了多模式注释的限限,并明此扩展在检测融为一体的改进。', 'ru': 'В разговорных анализах люди вручную вплетают мультимодальную информацию в стенограммы, что значительно отнимает много времени. Мы вводим систему, которая автоматически расширяет стенограммы видеозаписей разговоров с использованием мультимодальных потоков данных. Эта система использует набор правил предварительной обработки для включения мультимодальных аннотаций в стенографические отчеты и содействия их интерпретируемости. Наши вклады в проектирование характеристик носят двоякий характер: во-первых, мы определяем диапазон мультимодальных характеристик, имеющих отношение к обнаружению установления взаимопонимания; во-вторых, мы расширяем диапазон мультимодальных аннотаций и показываем, что расширение приводит к статистически значимым улучшениям в обнаружении установления взаимопонимания.', 'ja': '会話分析では、人間は手動でマルチモーダル情報をトランスクリプトに織り込むが、これは著しく時間がかかる。マルチモーダルデータストリームを使用して、ビデオ録画された会話の逐語録音を自動的に拡張するシステムを導入しました。このシステムは、一連の前処理ルールを使用して、逐語的な成績証明書にマルチモーダルアノテーションを織り込み、解釈可能性を促進します。特徴エンジニアリングへの貢献は2つあります。1つ目は、ラポール構築の検出に関連するマルチモーダル特徴の範囲を特定することです。2つ目は、マルチモーダルアノテーションの範囲を拡大し、拡張がラポール構築の検出における統計的に有意な改善につながることを示します。', 'hi': 'संवादात्मक विश्लेषण में, मनुष्य मैन्युअल रूप से टेपों में मल्टीमॉडल जानकारी बुनते हैं, जो काफी समय लेने वाला है। हम एक ऐसी प्रणाली पेश करते हैं जो स्वचालित रूप से मल्टीमॉडल डेटा स्ट्रीम का उपयोग करके वीडियो-रिकॉर्ड की गई बातचीत के शब्दशः टेपों का विस्तार करती है। यह प्रणाली शब्दशः टेपों में मल्टीमॉडल एनोटेशन बुनने और व्याख्या को बढ़ावा देने के लिए प्रीप्रोसेसिंग नियमों के एक सेट का उपयोग करती है। हमारे फीचर इंजीनियरिंग योगदान दो गुना हैं: सबसे पहले, हम तालमेल-निर्माण का पता लगाने के लिए प्रासंगिक मल्टीमॉडल सुविधाओं की सीमा की पहचान करते हैं; दूसरे, हम मल्टीमॉडल एनोटेशन की सीमा का विस्तार करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि विस्तार तालमेल-निर्माण का पता लगाने में सांख्यिकीय रूप से महत्वपूर्ण सुधार की ओर जाता है।', 'ga': 'In anailísí comhráite, déanann daoine faisnéis ilmhódach a fhí isteach sna tras-scríbhinní de láimh, rud a thógann go mór am. Tugaimid isteach córas a leathnaíonn go huathoibríoch na hathscríbhinní focal ar fhocal de chomhráite fístaifeadta ag baint úsáide as sruthanna sonraí ilmhódacha. Úsáideann an córas seo sraith rialacha réamhphróiseála chun nótaí ilmhódacha a fhí isteach sna tras-scríbhinní focal ar fhocal agus inléirmhíniú a chur chun cinn. Tá dhá ghné ag baint lenár rannchuidithe innealtóireachta gné: ar an gcéad dul síos, sainaithnímid an raon gnéithe ilmhódacha atá ábhartha chun caidreamh a fhorbairt; ar an dara dul síos, leathnaímid an raon nótaí ilmhódacha agus léirímid go dtagann feabhsuithe suntasacha staitistiúla chun caidreamh a fhorbairt as an leathnú.', 'el': 'Στις αναλύσεις συνομιλίας, οι άνθρωποι υφαίνουν χειροκίνητα πολυμορφικές πληροφορίες στις μεταγραφές, γεγονός που είναι σημαντικά χρονοβόρο. Εισάγουμε ένα σύστημα που επεκτείνει αυτόματα τις λεκτικές μεταγραφές των βίντεο-ηχογραφημένων συνομιλιών χρησιμοποιώντας πολυμορφικές ροές δεδομένων. Αυτό το σύστημα χρησιμοποιεί ένα σύνολο κανόνων προεπεξεργασίας για την ύφανση πολυμορφικών σχολίων στις λεκτικές μεταγραφές και την προώθηση της ερμηνείας. Οι συνεισφορές μας στη μηχανική χαρακτηριστικών είναι διττές: πρώτον, προσδιορίζουμε το εύρος των πολυμορφικών χαρακτηριστικών που σχετίζονται με την ανίχνευση της οικοδόμησης σχέσεων. Δεύτερον, επεκτείνουμε το εύρος των πολυτροπικών σχολιασμών και δείχνουμε ότι η επέκταση οδηγεί σε στατιστικά σημαντικές βελτιώσεις στην ανίχνευση της οικοδόμησης σχέσεων.', 'hu': 'A beszélgetési elemzések során az emberek manuálisan szövik multimodális információkat a transzkripciókba, ami jelentősen időigényes. Bevezetünk egy olyan rendszert, amely automatikusan kiterjeszti a videorögzített beszélgetések szó szerinti átiratait multimodális adatfolyamokkal. Ez a rendszer előfeldolgozási szabályokat használ arra, hogy multimodális jegyzeteket szövjön a szó szerinti átiratokba, és elősegítse az értelmezhetőséget. Jellemzőmérnöki hozzájárulásaink kétszeresek: először is azonosítjuk a kapcsolatépítés észleléséhez releváns multimodális funkciók körét; Másodszor bővítjük a multimodális megjegyzések skáláját, és megmutatjuk, hogy a bővítés statisztikailag jelentős javulást eredményez a kapcsolatépítés észlelésében.', 'ka': 'კონტრაციოლური ანალიზებში ადამიანები მანძილურად მულტიმოდიალური ინფორმაციას ტრანქრიპტებში გადატანა, რომელიც მნიშვნელოვანია დროის გამოყენება. ჩვენ ვიყენებთ სისტემა, რომელიც ავტომატურად გაფარდება ვიდეო დანაწილეთ პარაქტირების გერბატიმის ტრანქრიპტების გაფარდება მულტიმოდიალური მონაცემების ს ამ სისტემის გამოყენება წესების წესები, რომლებიც მულტიმოდიალური წესების გადატანა გერბატიმური ტრანსკრიპტებში და გამოყენება განსხვავებელობაში. ჩვენი ფუნქტური ინეზინერიის დამატება ორჯერ არის: პირველი, ჩვენ განვიცნობით მულტიმოდიალური ფუნქტურების განსაზღვრებისთვის, რომელიც შესაძლებელია შესახებ მეორე, ჩვენ მივიღეთ მულტიმოდიალური ანოტაციების დისპეზი და გამოჩვენება, რომ გაფართვა სტატისტიკურად მნიშვნელოვანი გაუქმედება შესაძლებლობაში.', 'it': "Nelle analisi conversazionali, gli esseri umani intrecciano manualmente informazioni multimodali nelle trascrizioni, il che richiede molto tempo. Introducemo un sistema che espande automaticamente le trascrizioni verbali delle conversazioni video registrate utilizzando flussi di dati multimodali. Questo sistema utilizza un insieme di regole di preelaborazione per tessere annotazioni multimodali nelle trascrizioni verbali e promuovere l'interpretabilità. I nostri contributi di feature engineering sono duplice: in primo luogo, identifichiamo la gamma di funzionalità multimodali rilevanti per rilevare il rapporto-building; in secondo luogo, ampliamo la gamma di annotazioni multimodali e mostriamo che l'espansione porta a miglioramenti statisticamente significativi nella rilevazione del rapporto-building.", 'lt': 'Per pokalbių analizę žmonės rankiniu būdu įtraukia daugiarūšio pobūdžio informaciją į transkriptus, kurie labai trukdo laikui. Įdiegiame sistemą, kuria automatiškai išplečiami žodiniai vaizdo įrašytų pokalbių transkriptai naudojant daugiarūšius duomenų srautus. Ši sistema naudoja parengiamojo apdorojimo taisyklių rinkinį daugiarūšio naudojimo įrašams į žodinius transkriptus įterpti ir aiškinimui skatinti. Mūsų indėlis į inžineriją yra dvigubas: pirma, nustatome įvairių įvairiarūšio transporto elementų, susijusių su ryšių kūrimu, įvairovę; secondly, we expand the range of multimodal annotations and show that the expansion leads to statistically significant improvements in detecting rapport-building.', 'mk': 'Во разговарачките анализи, луѓето рачно тепаат мултимодилни информации во транскриптите, што значително потрошува време. Ние воведуваме систем кој автоматски ги проширува вербалните транскрипти на видео-снимените разговори користејќи мултимодилни податоци. This system uses a set of preprocessing rules to weave multimodal annotations into the verbatim transcripts and promote interpretability.  Нашите инженерски придонеси се двојни: прво, ние го идентификуваме опсегот на мултимодилни карактеристики релевантни за детектирање на врски-градење; Второ, го прошируваме опсегот на мултимодилни анотации и покажуваме дека проширувањето води до статистички значителни подобрувања во детектирањето на градењето врски.', 'kk': 'Айнымалы талдау үшін адамдар көп модалдық мәліметті транскриптерге қолмен қолданып береді. Бұл уақыт пайдаланушысы үшін көп мәліметті. Біз бірнеше мәлімет деректерді көмегімен бейне жазылған сұрақтардың вербатимдік транскрипттерін автоматты түрде кеңейту жүйесін келтіреміз. Бұл жүйелік бірнеше модалдық жазбаларды вербатимдік транскрипттерге аудару және аудару мүмкіндігін өзгерту үшін алдын- процессердің ережелерін қолданады. Біздің инженерлік қасиеттеріміз екі рет: біріншіден, біз репорт құрылғысын анықтау үшін көптеген көптеген қасиеттердің аралығын анықтаймыз; Екіншіден, біз көптеген жазбалардың аралығын кеңейту және кеңейту ретінде статистикалық жақсарттарды анықтау үшін көптеген жақсарттарды көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Dalam analisis perbualan, manusia secara manual menguap maklumat multimodal ke dalam transkrip, yang sangat menghabiskan masa. Kami memperkenalkan sistem yang secara automatik mengembangkan transkrip verbal perbualan-rekod video menggunakan aliran data multimodal. Sistem ini menggunakan set peraturan pemprosesan awal untuk menekan anotasi multimodal ke dalam transkrip verbal dan mempromosikan interpretabiliti. kontribusi teknik ciri kami adalah dua kali ganda: pertama, kami mengenalpasti julat ciri-ciri multimodal yang berkaitan untuk mengesan bangunan hubungan; kedua, kita mengembangkan julat anotasi multimodal dan menunjukkan bahawa pengembangan membawa kepada peningkatan statistik yang signifikan dalam mengesan pembinaan-laporan.', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്ന വിശദീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d, മനുഷ്യര്\u200d കൈകാര്യം പല്ലിമോഡല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ക്രിപ്റ്റുകളിലേക്ക് കൊണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു സിസ്റ്റത്തെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത് സ്വയം വെര്\u200dബാറ്റിമിന്\u200d ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ക്രിപ്റ്റുകള്\u200d വിഡിയോ റെക്കോര്\u200dഡ്  ഈ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ വെര്\u200dബാറ്റിമിന്\u200d ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ക്രിപ്റ്റുകളിലേക്ക് ഒരു കൂട്ടം പ്രെക്സിസ്റ്റ് നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോ നമ്മുടെ പ്രത്യേക എഞ്ചിനീയറിങ്ങിന്\u200dറെ ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ട് ഇരട്ടിയാണ്: ആദ്യം, റോപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടിങിന്\u200dറെ കെട്ടിടത്തിന് ആവശ്യമുള് രണ്ടാമത്തേതായി, നമ്മള്\u200d പല്ലിമോഡാല്\u200d അഭിപ്രായം വികസിപ്പിക്കുകയും, വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് റോപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ബില്\u200dഡിങ്ങിങിന്\u200d', 'mt': 'F’analiżi ta’ konverżjoni, il-bnedmin jintwetaw manwalment informazzjoni multimodali fit-transkrizzjonijiet, li tieħu ħafna ħin b’mod sinifikanti. Aħna nintroduċu sistema li tespandi awtomatikament it-traskrizzjonijiet verbali ta’ konverżjonijiet irreġistrati bil-vidjo bl-użu ta’ flussi ta’ dejta multimodali. Din is-sistema tuża sett ta’ regoli ta’ preproċessar biex tissewwa annotazzjonijiet multimodali fit-transkrizzjonijiet verbali u tippromwovi l-interpretabbiltà. Il-kontribuzzjonijiet tagħna għall-inġinerija tal-karatteristiċi huma doppji: l-ewwel nett, nidentifikaw il-firxa ta’ karatteristiċi multimodali rilevanti biex jinstabu l-bini tar-relazzjonijiet; it-tieni nett, nispandu l-firxa ta’ annotazzjonijiet multimodali u nuru li l-espansjoni twassal għal titjib statistikament sinifikanti fl-iskoperta tal-bini tar-rapporti.', 'pl': 'W analizach konwersacyjnych ludzie ręcznie wplatają multimodalne informacje do transkrypcji, co jest znacznie czasochłonne. Wprowadzamy system, który automatycznie rozszerza dosłowne transkrypcje nagranych wideo rozmów za pomocą multimodalnych strumieni danych. System ten wykorzystuje zestaw reguł przetwarzania wstępnego do wplatania adnotacji multimodalnych do transkrypcji dosłownych i promowania interpretacji. Nasz wkład w inżynierię funkcji jest dwukrotny: po pierwsze, identyfikujemy zakres cech multimodalnych istotnych dla wykrywania budowania relacji; Po drugie, rozszerzamy zakres adnotacji multimodalnych i pokazujemy, że rozszerzenie prowadzi do statystycznie istotnych usprawnień w wykrywaniu relacji.', 'mn': 'Харин ярилцлагын шинжилгээнд хүмүүс олон загварын мэдээллийг хураагдаж, хугацааны хэрэглээнд маш чухал. Бид бичлэгийн бичлэг бичигдсэн ярилцлагуудыг автоматаар нэмэгдүүлдэг системийг олон моделийн өгөгдлийн урсгал ашиглан танилцуулдаг. Энэ систем хэдэн арга хэмжээний үйл ажиллагааг ашиглаж, олон моделийн анзааралтуудыг илтгэлцүүлэхэд, илтгэлцүүлэлтийг дэмждэг. Бидний хувьд инженерчлэлийн тусламжууд хоёр дахин ихэвчлэн байна: эхлээд бид харилцааны барилгыг олохын тулд холбоотой олон загваруудыг олж мэднэ. Хоёрдугаарт, бид олон загварын анзаарлыг нэмэгдүүлж, харилцааны барилгыг олохын тулд статистикийн чухал сайжруулах боломжтой гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'ro': 'În analizele conversaționale, oamenii țesă manual informații multimodale în transcrieri, ceea ce este semnificativ consumator de timp. Introducem un sistem care extinde automat transcrierile verbale ale conversațiilor înregistrate video folosind fluxuri de date multimodale. Acest sistem folosește un set de reguli de pre-procesare pentru a țesu adnotări multimodale în transcrierile verbatime și pentru a promova interpretabilitatea. Contribuțiile noastre de inginerie a caracteristicilor sunt duble: în primul rând, identificăm gama de caracteristici multimodale relevante pentru detectarea consolidării raporturilor; în al doilea rând, extindem gama de adnotări multimodale și arătăm că extinderea duce la îmbunătățiri semnificative statistic în detectarea consolidării raporturilor.', 'no': 'I konvertasjonale analyser er menneske manuelt vekk multimodal informasjon i transkriptane, som er signifikant tidspunkt. Vi introduserer eit system som automatisk utvidar verbatimtranskriptene av video-lagra samtaler med multimodal datastrømmer. Denne systemet brukar eit sett av førehandsamingsreglar for å vekke fleire merknader inn i verbatimtranskriptene og gjera tolkingsfeilighet. Funksjonsbehandlingane våre er to ganger: først identifiserer vi området av fleire modal funksjonar som er relevante for å oppdaga rapportebygging. for det andre, vi utvidar området av fleire modal notasjonar og viser at utvidinga fører til statistisk signifikante forbedringar i oppdaging av rapportebygging.', 'so': 'Baaritaanka hadalka dadku waxey si rasmi ah ugu isticmaalaan macluumaad kala duduwan warqada qoraalka, kaas oo aad u badan isticmaalka wakhtiga. Waxaynu soo bandhignaa nidaam oo si automati ah u sii kordhiya qoraalka warqadda qoraalka ee hadalka fiidiyowga lagu qoray oo lagu isticmaalayo weerarka data oo kala duduwan. Sidaa darteed nidaamkan wuxuu u isticmaalaa qaynuunno ka baaraandegista si uu u sameeyo warqadaha qoraalka ah oo kala duduwan oo uu u horumariyo turjubaan. Kharashaadyadayada injiilku waa laba jeer: marka ugu horeysa waxaynu aqoonsanaynaa noocyo kala duduwan oo ku saabsan in la ogaado dhismaha wargeyska; labaad, waxaynu kordhisnay daryeel kala duduwan, waxaana muujinnay in boodhku wuxuu ku socdaa hagaajinta si statistic ah oo ka horumarinta dhismaha wargeyska.', 'sv': 'I konversationsanalyser väver människan manuellt in multimodal information i transkriptionerna, vilket är betydligt tidskrävande. Vi introducerar ett system som automatiskt utökar textutdragen av videoinspelade samtal med hjälp av multimodala dataströmmar. Detta system använder en uppsättning förbehandlingsregler för att väva multimodala anteckningar i ordagrant och främja tolkning. Våra funktionstekniska bidrag är två: För det första identifierar vi de multimodala funktioner som är relevanta för att upptäcka relationsbyggande. För det andra utökar vi utbudet av multimodala anteckningar och visar att expansionen leder till statistiskt signifikanta förbättringar i detekteringen av rapportbyggande.', 'sr': 'U razgovornim analizima, ljudi ručno oslobađaju multimodalne informacije u transkript, što je značajno potrošenje vremena. Predstavljamo sistem koji automatski proširi verbatim transkripta video snimljenih razgovora koristeći multimodalne podatke. Ovaj sistem koristi gomilu pravila preobrađivanja kako bi oslobodili multimodalne annotacije u verbatimske transkripte i promovisali interpretabilnost. Naši doprinosi inženjerstva su dvaput: prvo, identifikujemo raspon multimodalnih karakteristika relevantnih za otkrivanje zgrade izveštaja; Drugo, proširili smo raspon multimodalnih annotacija i pokazali da se proširenje vodi do statistički značajnih poboljšanja u otkrivanju zgrade izveštaja.', 'si': 'වාර්තාවික විශ්ලේෂණයේ මිනිස්සුන් අතුරුදක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා වාර්තාවික තොරතුරු වලට, ඒක ගොඩක් විශේ අපි වීඩියෝව ලිකාර්ඩ් කතාවක් භාවිත කරන්න ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාව ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් විස්තර කරන පද්ධතියක් පෙන මේ පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාපනය නීතියක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා වගේම වර්කාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාපනය වලට වර්කාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාපන අපේ විශේෂතාවක් ඉන්ජිනිජින් සම්බන්ධතාවක් දෙකක් විතරයි: මුලින්ම, අපි වාර්තාවක් ගොඩනිර්මාණය පරීක්ෂ දෙවනියෙන්, අපි ගොඩක් මෝඩාල් කිරීම් විස්තර කරනවා ඒ වගේම පෙන්වන්නේ විස්තර විස්තර විස්තර විස්තර විස්තර විස්ත', 'ta': 'பேச்சு ஆராய்ச்சிகளில், மனிதர்கள் கைமுறையாக பல்வேறு தகவல்களை கொண்டு வருகிறார்கள், அது முக்கியமான நேரம் பயன்படுத்தல். நாம் ஒரு அமைப்பை தானாகவே வீடியோ பதிவிடப்பட்ட பேச்சின் எழுத்துருக்களை விரிவாக்கும் பொழுது பல தரவுத் தளங்களை பயன்படுத் இந்த அமைப்பு முன் செயல்படுத்தல் விதிமுறைகளை பயன்படுத்தும் வெற்றிடம் எழுத்துக்களுக்கு பல முறையான அறிவிப்புகளை அணுகு எங்கள் தனிப்பயன் பொறியியல் பங்கள் இரண்டு மடங்கு: முதலில், நாம் அறிக்கை கட்டுப்பாட்டை கண்டறிந்து கொள்ள பல்மடங்கு குணங்களின் வீச இரண்டாவது, நாம் பல்வேறு அறிவிப்புகளை விரிவாக்கி விரிவாக்கி அறிக்கை கட்டுதலை கண்டறிதலில் புள்ளிவிவரமான முக்கியமான முன்னேற', 'ur': 'مکالمانی تحلیل میں، انسانوں کو متعدد موڈال معلومات کے ذریعے ترنسکرپٹوں میں دھوپ دیتے ہیں، جو بہت اہم وقت صرف کرتا ہے. ہم ایک سیسٹم کو معلوم کرتے ہیں جو ویڈیو راکروڈ کی باتوں کی ویروپٹیمیم ترنسکرپٹوں کو اپنے ساتھ پھیلاتا ہے This system uses a set of preprocessing rules to weave multimodal annotations in the verbatim transcripts and promote interpretability. ہمارے فرصت انجینرینگ کے ذریعے دو دفعہ ہیں: پہلی بار، ہم نے راپ ورٹ بنیاد کو پہچان کرنے کے لئے موجود multimodal features کی مدت کو پہچان لیا ہے، دوسرا، ہم نے بہت سی موڈال انٹوریزوں کی طرح پھیلائی اور دکھائی کہ انٹوریزوں کی تعداد منحصر سے اضافہ کرنے کے لئے اضافہ ہے۔', 'uz': "Ko'pchilik taʼminotlarida, odamlar qo'lbola qo'lbola boshqa maʼlumot tarkibini o'rganadi. Bu muhim vaqt foydalanishi mumkin. Biz bir tizimni avtomatik foydalanuvchi multimodal maʼlumot tartiblari bilan yordamida avtomatik yozib olish va video yozib borilgan muloqat muvaffaqiyatlarni ko'paytirish. Name Bizning tashkilotlarimiz muhandiya qandaydir ikki marta bo'lgan. Birinchisi, biz Report Buyruqni aniqlash uchun multimodal xususiyatlarning chegarasini aniqlashimiz mumkin; ikkinchisi, biz multimodal taqdimot chegarasini ko'payamiz va kengaytmani hisoblash uchun statistik muhim improviyatlarni aniqlash mumkin.", 'vi': 'Trong các phân tích cuộc đối thoại, con người đan các thông tin đa phương vào các đoạn ghi chép, rất tốn thời gian. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một hệ thống sẽ tự động mở rộng các đoạn ghi âm video bằng các dòng chảy dữ liệu đa phương. Hệ thống này sử dụng một bộ luật xử lý tiền chế để trộn các ghi chú đa phương vào các ghi chép tổng hợp và thúc đẩy giải thích. Sự đóng góp kỹ thuật của chúng tôi gồm hai lần: Đầu tiên, chúng tôi xác định các tính năng đa chiều liên quan tới việc phát hiện kế hoạch. Thứ hai, chúng ta mở rộng phạm vi ghi chú đa phương và cho thấy sự mở rộng này dẫn đến những cải tiến số quan trọng trong việc phát hiện mối quan hệ.', 'bg': 'В разговорните анализи хората ръчно тъкат мултимодална информация в транскрипциите, което отнема значително време. Въвеждаме система, която автоматично разширява вербалните транскрипции на видео записани разговори с помощта на мултимодални потоци от данни. Тази система използва набор от правила за предварителна обработка, за да изтъкне мултимодални анотации в вербалните транскрипции и да насърчава интерпретацията. Нашият принос в инженерството на характеристиките е двукратен: първо, ние идентифицираме гамата от мултимодални функции, свързани с откриването на изграждане на взаимоотношения; второ, разширяваме обхвата на мултимодални анотации и показваме, че разширяването води до статистически значими подобрения в откриването на изграждане на връзки.', 'da': 'I samtaleanalyser fletter mennesker manuelt multimodal information ind i udskrifterne, hvilket er betydeligt tidskrævende. Vi introducerer et system, der automatisk udvider udskrifterne af videooptagede samtaler ved hjælp af multimodale datastrømme. Dette system bruger et sæt forbearbejdningsregler til at væve multimodale annotationer ind i udskrifterne og fremme fortolkningen. Vores bidrag til feature engineering er dobbelt: For det første identificerer vi udvalget af multimodale funktioner, der er relevante for at opdage relationsopbygning; For det andet udvider vi rækken af multimodale noteringer og viser, at udvidelsen fører til statistisk signifikante forbedringer i detektering af rapportopbygning.', 'nl': 'Bij gespreksanalyses weven mensen handmatig multimodale informatie in de transcripten, wat aanzienlijk tijdrovend is. We introduceren een systeem dat automatisch de letterlijke transcripties van video-opgenomen gesprekken uitbreidt met behulp van multimodale datastromen. Dit systeem maakt gebruik van een reeks voorverwerkingsregels om multimodale annotaties in de letterlijke transcripten te weven en de interpreteerbaarheid te bevorderen. Onze feature engineering bijdragen zijn tweeledig: ten eerste identificeren we het scala van multimodale kenmerken die relevant zijn voor het detecteren van rapportage-building; Ten tweede breiden we het bereik van multimodale annotaties uit en laten we zien dat de uitbreiding leidt tot statistisch significante verbeteringen in het detecteren van rapportage-building.', 'de': 'Bei Gesprächsanalysen webt der Mensch multimodale Informationen manuell in die Transkripte ein, was deutlich zeitaufwändig ist. Wir führen ein System ein, das die wortwörtlichen Transkripte von videoaufgezeichneten Gesprächen automatisch mit multimodalen Datenströmen erweitert. Dieses System verwendet eine Reihe von Vorverarbeitungsregeln, um multimodale Anmerkungen in die wörtlichen Transkripte zu weben und die Interpretierbarkeit zu fördern. Unsere Beiträge zum Feature Engineering sind zweifach: Erstens identifizieren wir die Bandbreite multimodaler Merkmale, die für die Erkennung von Rapport-Building relevant sind; Zweitens erweitern wir das Spektrum multimodaler Annotationen und zeigen, dass die Erweiterung zu statistisch signifikanten Verbesserungen bei der Erkennung von Rapport-Building führt.', 'hr': 'U razgovornim analizima, ljudi ručno oslobađaju multimodalne informacije u transkript, što je značajno potrošenje vremena. Predstavljamo sustav koji automatski proširi verbatim transkript snimljenih razgovora s koristom multimodalnih potoka podataka. Ovaj sustav koristi gomilu pravila preobrađivanja kako bi oslobodili multimodalne annotacije u verbatimske transkripte i promovirali interpretabilnost. Naši doprinosi inženjerstva su dvaput: prvo, identificiramo raspon multimodalnih karakteristika relevantnih za otkrivanje zgrade izvještaja; Drugo, proširili smo raspon multimodalnih annotacija i pokazali da proširenje vodi do statistički značajnih poboljšanja u otkrivanju zgrade izvještaja.', 'id': 'Dalam analisis konversasi, manusia secara manual membentuk informasi multimodal ke dalam transkrip, yang sangat menghabiskan waktu. Kami memperkenalkan sistem yang secara otomatis memperluas transkrip verbal dari konversasi video-rekaman menggunakan aliran data multimodal. Sistem ini menggunakan set peraturan pemroses untuk menggunakan anotasi multimodal ke transkrip verbal dan mempromosikan interpretabilitas. Kontribusi teknik karakteristik kami dua kali lipat: pertama-tama, kami mengidentifikasi jangkauan karakteristik multimodal yang relevan untuk mendeteksi pembangunan hubungan; kedua, kita memperluas jangkauan anotasi multimodal dan menunjukkan bahwa ekspansi membawa ke peningkatan statistik yang signifikan dalam mendeteksi pembangunan rapport.', 'fa': 'در تحلیل\u200cهای مکالمه، انسان\u200cها به دستی اطلاعات چند مدل را در ترجمه\u200cها می\u200cآورند، که به طور کلی زمان\u200cconsumption است. ما سیستم را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که با استفاده از رودهای داده\u200cهای چندین مدل، ترجمه\u200cهای ویدئو ضبط شده را به طور خودکار گسترش می\u200cدهد. این سیستم از مجموعه قوانین پیش\u200cپردازی استفاده می\u200cکند تا نوشته\u200cهای چندین مدل را در ترجمه\u200cهای کلمات و توسعه قابلیت تعبیر دهد. شرکت مهندسی ویژه\u200cهای ما دو برابر هستند: اول، ما مدت چندین ویژه\u200cهای متفاوتی را برای شناسایی ساختمان گزارش شناسایی می\u200cکنیم. دوم، ما مجموعه نوشته های چندین مدل را گسترش دادیم و نشان می دهیم که گسترش به سوی بهترین آمار ارزشمند در کشف ساختمان گزارش.', 'ko': '회화 분석에서 인류가 수동으로 다중모드 정보를 복사본에 엮는 것은 시간이 많이 걸린다.우리는 이 시스템이 다중모드 데이터 흐름을 이용하여 영상 기록 대화의 한 글자 한 글자 기록을 자동으로 확장하는 시스템을 소개했다.이 시스템은 사전 처리 규칙을 사용하여 다중모드 주석을 한 글자씩 기록에 짜서 해석성을 높인다.우리의 특징 공사 공헌은 두 가지가 있다. 첫째, 우리는 검측 융화 관계와 관련된 다중모드적 특징의 범위를 확정했다.그 다음에 우리는 다중모드 주석의 범위를 확대했고 이러한 확장은 검측 융화 관계 구축에 있어 통계적인 현저한 개선을 가져왔다는 것을 나타냈다.', 'sq': 'Në analizat e bisedimeve, njerëzit përdorin me dorë informacionin multimodal në transkriptet, që është shumë kohëconsumuese. Ne futim një sistem që automatikisht zgjeron transkriptet verbale të bisedimeve video-rregjistruara duke përdorur rrjedhjet e të dhënave multimodale. Ky sistem përdor një sërë rregullash paraprocesuese për të theksuar anotacionet multimodale në transkriptet verbale dhe për të nxitur interpretueshmërinë. Our feature engineering contributions are two-fold: firstly, we identify the range of multimodal features relevant to detect rapport-building;  së dyti, ne zgjerojmë gamën e anotacioneve multimodale dhe tregojmë se zgjerimi çon në përmirësime statistikisht të rëndësishme në zbulimin e ndërtimit të raporteve.', 'sw': 'Katika uchambuzi wa mazungumzo, binadamu wanavaa taarifa za watu kadhaa katika maandiko hayo, ambayo ni matumizi makubwa ya muda. Tunaonyesha mfumo unaoeneza kwa faragha kupanua maeneo ya kawaida ya mazungumzo yaliyoandikwa kwenye video kwa kutumia mitandao ya takwimu mbalimbali. Mfumo huu unatumia aina ya kanuni za upasuaji ili kuweka matatizo mengi ya utambulisho katika maandishi ya mpira na kutangaza tafsiri. michango yetu ya uhandisi ni mara mbili: kwanza, tunatambua kiwango cha vipengele vinavyohusiana na kugundua jengo la taarifa; pili, tunaongezea kiwango cha matangazo mengi na kuonyesha kwamba ukuaji huo unapelekea maendeleo muhimu katika kutambua jengo la taarifa.', 'tr': 'Qonuşma analizlerinde, insan çözümlere çomodal bilgi elde edip, zamanı tüketmektedir. Biz multimodal veri akışlarını kullanarak, video kaydedilen sohbetlerinin verbatim hakkında otomatik olarak yayılan bir sistemi tanıtıyoruz. Bu sistem bir çeşit önden işleme kurallarını verbatim terjimelerine süslemek ve yorumluluğu tertiblemek için kullanır. Biziň özelliklerimiz inženjeriyetçiliklerimiz ikinji gezek: ilkinji gezek, rapport binasyny tanymak üçin baglanyp biljek multimodal hasaplaryny tanyýarys; Ikinjisi bolsa, biz multimodal täzelikleri genişletip ýagdaýlaýarys we rapport binasyny tanyşdyrmak üçin statistiki möhüm gelişmelere ýöredip bilýäris.', 'hy': 'Խոսակցության վերլուծություններում մարդիկ ձեռքով հաղորդակցվում են բազմամոդալ տեղեկատվությունը հաղորդակցման մեջ, ինչը շատ ժամանակ է պահանջում: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի համակարգ, որը ինքնաբերաբար ընդլայնում է վիդեո-ձայնագրված հաղորդակցությունների խոսքերը օգտագործելով բազմամոդալ տվյալների հոսքեր: Այս համակարգը օգտագործում է մի շարք նախամշակվող կանոններ, որոնք օգտագործում են բազմամոդալ annoտացիաներ բառային հաղորդակցման մեջ և խրախուսում են թարգմանելիությունը: Մեր հատկանիշների ճարտարագիտական ներդրումը երկու անգամ է: Առաջինը, մենք բացահայտում ենք բազմամոդալ հատկանիշներ, որոնք կարևոր են հարաբերությունների կառուցման հայտնաբերման համար: երկրորդ, մենք ընդլայնում ենք բազմամոդալ նոտացիաների շարքը և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ընդլայնումը հանգեցնում է վիճակագրական նշանակալի բարելավումների հարաբերությունների կառուցման հայտնաբերման մեջ:', 'af': "In konversasionale analiserings, mense het manier multimodaal inligting in die transkripte swaar, wat betekenlik tyd-gebruik is. Ons introduseer 'n stelsel wat automaties die verbatime transkripte van video-opgenereerde gesprekke uitbrei deur multimodale data strome te gebruik. Hierdie stelsel gebruik 'n stel van voorafverwerking reëls om multimodale notasies in die verbatiese transkripte te weef en uitleggbare te promoteer. Ons funksie inženiering bydraaiïngs is twee maal: eerste, ons identifiseer die omvang van multimodale funksies wat relevante is om rapport-bou te ontdek; tweedeel, ons uitbrei die omvang van multimodale notasies en wys dat die uitbreiding lei na statistiese betaling verbeteringe in die opspoor van rapportbou.", 'az': 'Konuşuşma analizələrində insanlar çoxlu modal məlumatlarını transkriptlərə götürür, bu çox vaxt istifadə edir. Biz, çoxlu modal veri akışlarını istifadə edərək video-kaydedilən söhbətlərin verbatim transkriptlərini avtomatik olaraq genişləyən bir sistemi təşkil edirik. Bu sistem çoxlu modal ifadələri verbatim transkriptlərinə qoymaq və yorumluluğu artırmaq üçün ön işləmə qaydalarını istifadə edir. İlk dəfə, raport binasını keşfetmək üçün çoxlu modal özelliklərin səviyyəsini tanıyırıq. ikinci dəfə, çoxlu modal məlumatların səviyyəsini genişləndirdik və bu genişlənmə, raport binasını keşfetmək üçün statistik olaraq möhkəm düzəltmələrə yol göstərir.', 'bn': 'কথোপকথন বিশ্লেষণে মানুষ হাতে ট্র্যান্সপ্রিপ্টে বহুটিমোডাল তথ্য পাওয়া যায়, যা গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সময়-ভক্ষণ। আমরা একটি সিস্টেমের পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি যা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ভিডিও-রেকর্ডের কথোপকথনের ভার্বাটিম ট্র্যান্সপ্রেপ্ট ব এই সিস্টেম ব্যবহার করে ভার্বাটিম ট্র্যান্সপ্রিক্রিপ্টের মধ্যে বহুটিমোডাল বিভ্রান্তির বিষয়বস্তুর বিষয়বস্তু  আমাদের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর প্রতিযোগিতা দুই গুণ: প্রথমত, আমরা রিপোর্ট বিল্ডিং সনাক্ত করার জন্য প্রয়োজনীয় বহুটিমোডাল বৈশিষ্ দ্বিতীয়ত্বে, আমরা বহুবিদ্যুত বিষয়টি বৃদ্ধি করেছি এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে বিস্তারিত বিস্তারিত পরিসংখ্যানের পরিসংখ্যানে প্রত', 'bs': 'U razgovornim analizima, ljudi ručno oslobađaju multimodalne informacije u transkript, što je značajno potrošenje vremena. Predstavljamo sistem koji automatski proširi verbatim transkripta video snimljenih razgovora koristeći multimodalne sustave podataka. Ovaj sistem koristi gomilu pravila preobrađivanja kako bi oslobodio multimodalne annotacije u verbatimske transkripte i promovirao interpretabilnost. Naši doprinosi inženjerstva su dvaput: prvo, identificiramo raspon multimodalnih karakteristika relevantnih za otkrivanje zgrade izvještaja; Drugo, proširili smo raspon multimodalnih annotacija i pokazali da proširenje vodi do statistički značajnih poboljšanja u otkrivanju zgrade izvještaja.', 'ca': "En les anàlisis conversacionals, els humans teixen manualment la informació multimodal a les transcripcions, que consumeix molt de temps. Introduïm un sistema que expandeix automàticament les transcripcions verbals de converses gravades vídeo fent servir corrents de dades multimodals. Aquest sistema utilitza un conjunt de regles de preprocessió per teixir anotacions multimodals en les transcripcions verbals i promoure l'interpretabilitat. Les nostres contribucions en enginyeria de característiques són dues vegades: primer, identifiquem la gamma de característiques multimodals pertinents per detectar la construcció de relacions; en segon lloc, ampliem la gamma d'anotacions multimodals i demostrem que l'expansió porta a millores estatísticament significatives en la detecció de la creació de rapports.", 'cs': 'V konverzačních analýzách člověk ručně vkládá multimodální informace do přepisů, což je výrazně časově náročné. Představujeme systém, který automaticky rozšiřuje doslovné přepisy video nahraných konverzací pomocí multimodálních datových toků. Tento systém používá sadu pravidel předzpracování k propojení multimodálních anotací do doslovných přepisů a podpoře interpretovatelnosti. Naše příspěvky jsou dvojnásobné: za prvé identifikujeme rozsah multimodálních prvků relevantních pro detekci budování vztahů; Za druhé rozšiřujeme rozsah multimodálních anotací a ukazujeme, že rozšíření vede ke statisticky významným zlepšením v detekci budování vztahů.', 'fi': 'Keskusteluanalyyseissä ihmiset kutovat manuaalisesti multimodaalista tietoa transkriptioteihin, mikä on huomattavasti aikaa vievää. Esittelemme järjestelmän, joka laajentaa automaattisesti videonauhoitettujen keskustelujen sanamuotojen transkriptioita multimodaalisilla datavirroilla. Tämä järjestelmä käyttää esikäsittelyssääntöjä monimodaalisten merkintöjen kutomiseen sanaperäisiin transkriptioteihin ja tulkittavuuden edistämiseen. Ominaisuustekniikka on kaksitahoinen: ensinnäkin tunnistamme multimodaaliset ominaisuudet, jotka ovat merkityksellisiä vuorovaikutuksen luomisen havaitsemiseksi; Toiseksi laajennamme multimodaalisten huomautusten valikoimaa ja osoitamme, että laajennus johtaa tilastollisesti merkittäviin parannuksiin vuorovaikutuksen tunnistamisessa.', 'et': 'Vestlusanalüüsides kuduvad inimesed transkriptsioonidesse käsitsi multimodaalset informatsiooni, mis on märkimisväärselt aeganõudev. Tutvustame süsteemi, mis automaatselt laiendab video salvestatud vestluste sõnasõnalisi transkriptsioone multimodaalsete andmevoogude abil. See süsteem kasutab eeltöötlusreegleid, et kanda mitmeliigilisi annotatsioone sõnasõnalistesse transkriptsioonidesse ja edendada tõlgendatavust. Meie funktsioonide tehnoloogia panus on kahekordne: esiteks määratleme mitmeliigiliste funktsioonide valiku, mis on olulised seoste loomiseks; teiseks laiendame multimodaalsete annotatsioonide valikut ja näitame, et laienemine toob kaasa statistiliselt olulise paranemise suhete loomisel.', 'am': 'በአካባቢ አስተያየት፣ ሰዎች በብዙ አካባቢ መረጃዎችን ለጽሑፎች እና በጊዜው ለመጠቀም የሚያስፈልጉ ናቸው፡፡ የቪዲዮ-የድምፅ ጽሑፎችን በብዛት የዳታ ወንዞች በመጠቀም የሚዘረጋውን የቪዲዮ-የዘርፍ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ This system uses a set of preprocessing rules to weave multimodal annotations into the verbatim transcripts and promote interpretability.  የፊደል ኢንጂንተርናዊ አቀማመጥ ሁለት እጥፍ ነው፤ በመጀመሪያ፣ የሪፖርት ግንኙነቶችን ለማግኘት የሚጠቅሙትን የብልሃት ምርጫዎች እናውቃለን፡፡ በሁለተኛው፣ የብዙ አካባቢ ማስታወቂያውን እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'sk': 'V pogovornih analizah ljudje ročno tkajo multimodalne informacije v transkripcije, kar je bistveno zamudno. Predstavljamo sistem, ki samodejno razširi dobesedne transkripcije video posnetih pogovorov z uporabo multimodalnih podatkovnih tokov. Ta sistem uporablja niz predobdelavnih pravil za tkanje multimodalnih opomb v dobesedne transkripcije in spodbujanje interpretabilnosti. Naši prispevki za inženiring značilnosti so dvojni: prvič, opredelimo obseg multimodalnih značilnosti, ki so pomembne za odkrivanje povezave; drugič, razširimo obseg multimodalnih opomb in pokažemo, da širitev vodi do statistično pomembnih izboljšav pri odkrivanju povezovanja.', 'he': 'בניתוחים שיחותיים, בני האדם מנצחים ידנית מידע רב-מודיאלי לתוך התסריטים, וזה מבזבז זמן באופן משמעותי. אנחנו מציגים מערכת שמרחבת באופן אוטומטי את העתקים המיליים של שיחות הווידאו הקלטות באמצעות זרמי נתונים רבים מודליים. המערכת הזאת משתמשת בסט של חוקים מעבדה מוקדמת כדי לנצח ציונים רבים מודליים לתוך תרשומות מילים ולהקדם את היכולת לפרש. התרומות הנדסה שלנו הן כפולות: ראשית, אנו מזהה את טווח הנדסים המולטומודאליים רלוונטיים לגלות בניין יחסים; שנית, אנו מרחיבים את טווח ההערות המולטומודליות ולהראות שההרחבה מובילה לשיפורים סטטיסטיים משמעותיים בלגלות בניין יחסים.', 'jv': 'Nang cara-cara dialog Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem sing otomatik bukalakno kanggo nyenggawe verbatim karo nggawe video sing nyenggawe karo sistem sing dadi multimodal Sistem iki sistem sistem sistem nduwé akeh sing perusahaan nggawe dadi multimodal karo nggawe dadi sing perusahaan karo perusahaan karo nggawe akeh tarjamahan. Awak dhéwé caret inênjering perusahaan iki-kat: angkang, kita isih luwih perusahaan karo multimodal karo nggawe barang nggawe rapporto-king; wis segondha, kita katweke nggawe akeh populer podho akeh multimodal lan wong liyane kuwi nggawe barang nggawe barang langkung bantuan liyane mung njaluk akeh lanu kanggo nggawe barang rapports.', 'ha': "Daga ƙidãya masu husũma, mutum yana samun mutane da takarda multi-mutane zuwa takardan rubutun, wanda yana mai amfani da lokaci mai girma. Tuna ƙara wani na'ura wanda ke shimfiɗa takardar takardar da za'a rubutu da filayen da aka rubuta na video da amfani da kõguna na multi-dane. Wannan na'ura yana amfani da wasu sharciyar pre-aiki don ya shafe alama masu multi-rubutu cikin takardar rubutun verbatim kuma ya promote fassarar fassarar. Kayyakanmu na masu aikin injini ko biyu ne: na farkon, za'a gane wasu masu tsari na masu amfani da yin ganin tsarin Razor; na sakan, za'a buɗe tsakiya masu motsi na multi-mutane kuma za'a nũna in faɗin ta ƙara domin gyarata masu muhimmi a gane-bincike-na-jumi.", 'bo': 'གཏམ་གླེང་བའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ནང་དུ་མི་ཚོས་རྣམས་ལག་ནས་མཐུན་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆའི་གནས་ཚུལ་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་བརྙན་ཐོའི་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་ནང་གི་བྱ་ཚིག་གསལ་གཞུང་ཞིག་ལ་སྟོན་པ This system uses a set of preprocessing rules to weave multimodal annotations in the verbatim transcripts and promote interpretability. Our feature engineering contributions are two-fold: first, we identify the range of multimodal features relevant to detect rapport-building; and གཉིས་པ་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་སྣང་ཚུལ་མང་ཆེ་རུ་གཏོང་བ་དང་ཁྱབ'}
{'en': 'Does Typological Blinding Impede Cross-Lingual Sharing?', 'ar': 'هل يعوق التعمية النمطي المشاركة عبر اللغات؟', 'es': '¿El cegamiento tipológico impide el intercambio multilingüe?', 'pt': 'A cegueira tipológica impede o compartilhamento entre idiomas?', 'fr': "L'insu typologique empêche-t-il le partage multilingue\xa0?", 'ja': 'タイポロジカルブラインディングはクロスリンガルシェアリングを妨げますか？', 'ru': 'Препятствует ли типологическое ослепление межъязыковому обмену?', 'zh': '类型学盲法何妨跨语共?', 'hi': 'क्या टाइपोलॉजिकल ब्लाइंडिंग क्रॉस-लिंगुअल शेयरिंग को बाधित करता है?', 'ga': 'An gcuireann Daille Tíopeolaíoch Cosc ar Chomhroinnt Thrastheangach?', 'ka': 'თმა ლთ რთოლჲდთფვჟკთ ჟლვოგაღთ გპვმვ ჱა კპყჟრლთნდსგალნჲჟრ?', 'el': 'Η τυπολογική τύφλωση εμποδίζει τη γλωσσική κοινή χρήση;', 'hu': 'A tipológiai vakság akadályozza a nyelvek közötti megosztást?', 'it': 'La cecità tipologica ostacola la condivisione interculturale?', 'lt': 'Ar tipologinis aklumas trukdo tarpkalbiniam dalijimuisi?', 'kk': 'Типтологиялық жарықтың көтерілі тілдерді ортақтастыру керек пе?', 'mk': 'Does Typological Blinding Impede Cross-Lingual Sharing?', 'ml': 'ടൈപോളിക്കല്\u200d ബ്ലിങ്ങിങ് ക്രോസ്-ലിങ്ഗല്\u200d പങ്കെടുക്കുന്നുണ്ടോ?', 'mn': 'Типовологийн нөлөөлдөг нөлөөлдөг хэлбэрээр хуваалцах уу?', 'no': 'Er det typologiske blande Impede for krysslingsdeling?', 'pl': 'Czy typologiczne oślepienie hamuje dzielenie się między językami?', 'ro': 'Orbirea tipologică împiedică partajarea interlingvistică?', 'ms': 'Adakah Typological Blinding Impede Cross-Language Sharing?', 'sr': 'Da li je tipološki slijepi utjecaj preko Linguala?', 'mt': 'Does Typological Blinding Impede Cross-Lingual Sharing?', 'ta': 'Does Typological Blinding Impede Cross-Lingual Sharing?', 'si': 'ටායිපලෝගික බ්ලින්ඩ් ඉන්ධාරයක් ක්\u200dරොස් ලින්ගුවාල් එක්කම?', 'so': 'Sharciga luqada ee Yupological Blinding Impored Cross-Lingual?', 'sv': 'Hindrar typologisk blindning tvärspråklig delning?', 'ur': 'کیا تایپولوژیک بلینڈ ایمڈ کرس-لینگ شریک ہے؟', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đang chia sẻ ngôn ngữ chữ à?', 'hr': 'Da li tipološki slijepi utjecaj preko Lingualnog dijela?', 'bg': 'Дали типологичното заслепяване възпрепятства междулингвистичното споделяне?', 'da': 'Hindrer typologisk blinding tværsproglig deling?', 'nl': 'Is typologische verblinding belemmerd cross-lingual delen?', 'fa': 'آيا تفاوت تايپ\u200cلوژيکي\u200cي چشم\u200cپوشيده\u200cي درجه\u200cي درجه\u200cي زبان\u200cهايي داره؟', 'de': 'Beeinträchtigt typologische Blendung das sprachübergreifende Teilen?', 'id': 'Apakah Typological Blinding Impede Cross-Lingual Sharing?', 'tr': 'Tipiýalojik ýapýan etki hatlary kesişikli bölüşirmi?', 'sw': 'Je, mabadiliko ya Ki-Typological Improvement Cross-Lingua Sharia?', 'af': 'Het Tippologiese Blinde Impede Kruis-Linguale Deel?', 'ko': '유형맹증은 언어를 뛰어넘어 공유하는 것을 방해합니까?', 'sq': 'A i verbëri tipik pengon ndarjen ndër-gjuhësh?', 'az': 'Tipolojik Köpüklü Qısqa Dil Paylaşımı?', 'am': 'የመስኮት ቋንቋ', 'hy': 'Արդյո՞ք Տիպոլոգիական կուրացնող խոչընդոտում է լեզուների միջև կիսվելը:', 'ca': 'Impedi la ceguesa tipològica la compartició translíngua?', 'cs': 'Zakazuje typologické oslepení mezi jazykovým sdílením?', 'fi': 'Estääkö typologinen sokaisu kielten välistä jakamista?', 'bn': 'টাইপোলোজিক ব্লিন্ডিং কি ক্রস-লিঙ্গুয়াল শেয়ারিং করছে?', 'et': 'Kas tüpoloogiline pimestamine takistab keeleülest jagamist?', 'bs': 'Da li tipološki slijepi utjecaj na krstoLingualno dijeljenje?', 'he': 'האם עיוור טיפולוגי מפריע לחלוק לינגולי?', 'ha': 'Shin, KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Ali tipološko slepljenje preprečuje medjezikovno delitev?', 'jv': 'Apa ora Tipporologik Blinding Inajeng ?', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བའི་འགྱུར་བ་དེ་ཚོར་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ཉར་འཇུག་གི་ཡིན་ནམ།'}
{'en': 'Bridging the performance gap between high- and low-resource languages has been the focus of much previous work. Typological features from databases such as the World Atlas of Language Structures (WALS) are a prime candidate for this, as such data exists even for very low-resource languages. However, previous work has only found minor benefits from using typological information. Our hypothesis is that a model trained in a cross-lingual setting will pick up on typological cues from the input data, thus overshadowing the utility of explicitly using such features. We verify this hypothesis by blinding a model to typological information, and investigate how cross-lingual sharing and performance is impacted. Our model is based on a cross-lingual architecture in which the latent weights governing the sharing between languages is learnt during training. We show that (i) preventing this model from exploiting typology severely reduces performance, while a control experiment reaffirms that (ii) encouraging sharing according to typology somewhat improves performance.', 'ar': 'لقد كان سد فجوة الأداء بين اللغات ذات الموارد العالية والمنخفضة محور الكثير من الأعمال السابقة. الميزات النموذجية من قواعد البيانات مثل الأطلس العالمي لهياكل اللغة (WALS) هي مرشح رئيسي لهذا ، حيث توجد مثل هذه البيانات حتى للغات منخفضة الموارد للغاية. ومع ذلك ، لم يجد العمل السابق سوى فوائد طفيفة من استخدام المعلومات النمطية. فرضيتنا هي أن النموذج الذي يتم تدريبه في إعداد متعدد اللغات سوف يلتقط إشارات نمطية من بيانات الإدخال ، وبالتالي يطغى على فائدة استخدام هذه الميزات بشكل صريح. نتحقق من هذه الفرضية من خلال تعمية نموذج للمعلومات النمطية ، والتحقيق في كيفية تأثر المشاركة والأداء عبر اللغات. يعتمد نموذجنا على بنية متعددة اللغات يتم فيها تعلم الأوزان الكامنة التي تحكم المشاركة بين اللغات أثناء التدريب. نوضح أن (1) منع هذا النموذج من استغلال التصنيف يقلل الأداء بشدة ، بينما تؤكد تجربة التحكم أن (2) تشجيع المشاركة وفقًا للتصنيف يؤدي إلى حد ما إلى تحسين الأداء.', 'pt': 'Preencher a lacuna de desempenho entre linguagens de alto e baixo recursos tem sido o foco de muitos trabalhos anteriores. Recursos tipológicos de bancos de dados como o World Atlas of Language Structures (WALS) são os principais candidatos para isso, pois esses dados existem mesmo para linguagens de recursos muito baixos. No entanto, trabalhos anteriores encontraram apenas pequenos benefícios no uso de informações tipológicas. Nossa hipótese é que um modelo treinado em uma configuração multilíngue captará dicas tipológicas dos dados de entrada, ofuscando assim a utilidade de usar explicitamente esses recursos. Verificamos essa hipótese cegando um modelo para informações tipológicas e investigamos como o compartilhamento e o desempenho entre idiomas são afetados. Nosso modelo é baseado em uma arquitetura multilíngue na qual os pesos latentes que governam o compartilhamento entre os idiomas são aprendidos durante o treinamento. Mostramos que (i) impedir que este modelo explore a tipologia reduz severamente o desempenho, enquanto um experimento de controle reafirma que (ii) incentivar o compartilhamento de acordo com a tipologia melhora um pouco o desempenho.', 'es': 'Reducir la brecha de rendimiento entre los idiomas de recursos altos y bajos ha sido el objetivo de muchos trabajos anteriores. Las características tipológicas de bases de datos como el Atlas Mundial de Estructuras del Lenguaje (WALS) son las principales candidatas para ello, ya que estos datos existen incluso para idiomas de muy pocos recursos. Sin embargo, trabajos anteriores solo han encontrado beneficios menores del uso de información tipológica. Nuestra hipótesis es que un modelo entrenado en un entorno multilingüe captará las señales tipológicas de los datos de entrada, eclipsando así la utilidad del uso explícito de tales características. Verificamos esta hipótesis cegando un modelo a la información tipológica e investigamos cómo se ve afectado el intercambio y el rendimiento multilingüe. Nuestro modelo se basa en una arquitectura multilingüe en la que los pesos latentes que rigen el intercambio entre idiomas se aprenden durante la formación. Mostramos que (i) evitar que este modelo explote la tipología reduce drásticamente el rendimiento, mientras que un experimento de control reafirma que (ii) fomentar el intercambio según la tipología mejora en cierta medida el rendimiento.', 'fr': "Combler l'écart de performance entre les langues à ressources élevées et faibles a fait l'objet de nombreux travaux antérieurs. Les caractéristiques typologiques des bases de données telles que l'Atlas mondial des structures linguistiques (WALS) sont un candidat idéal pour cela, car de telles données existent même pour les langues à très faibles ressources. Toutefois, des travaux antérieurs n'ont révélé que des avantages mineurs de l'utilisation d'informations typologiques. Notre hypothèse est qu'un modèle entraîné dans un environnement multilingue captera des indices typologiques à partir des données d'entrée, éclipsant ainsi l'utilité d'utiliser explicitement de telles caractéristiques. Nous vérifions cette hypothèse en masquant un modèle aux informations typologiques, et nous étudions comment le partage et les performances interlinguistiques sont impactés. Notre modèle est basé sur une architecture multilingue dans laquelle les poids latents régissant le partage entre les langues sont appris pendant la formation. Nous montrons que (i) empêcher ce modèle d'exploiter la typologie réduit considérablement les performances, tandis qu'une expérience de contrôle réaffirme que (ii) encourager le partage selon la typologie améliore quelque peu les performances.", 'zh': '弥合高资言语低资源言语之间,相去直是前务的重点。 世界语言结构地图集(WALS)等数据库类型学特为主候选者,虽于资源非常低语,其数犹存。 然前事但见用类型学信息之微利。 吾之设也,取类型学线于跨语之中,而掩明用之实用性。 以类型学信息盲法验其伪设,并论跨语共享之性。 盖跨语架构,在架构之中,习言语之间,共在权重。 吾明(i)止其学之甚杀也,而申之以实验(ii)劝之以类型学,有以加焉。', 'ja': '高リソース言語と低リソース言語の間のパフォーマンスギャップを埋めることは、以前の多くの作業の焦点でした。 World Atlas of Language Structures （ WALS ）などのデータベースのタイプ機能は、非常に低いリソースの言語であってもそのようなデータが存在するため、このための最良の候補です。 ただし、前作では類型情報を利用することによるわずかなメリットしか見いだされていない。 私たちの仮説は、クロスリンガル設定でトレーニングされたモデルが入力データから類型的な手がかりを拾い、そのような機能を明示的に使用することの有用性を覆すというものです。 私たちは、モデルをタイプ情報に盲目化することによってこの仮説を検証し、クロスリンガルの共有とパフォーマンスがどのように影響を受けるかを調査します。 私たちのモデルは、トレーニング中に言語間の共有を管理する潜在的な重みが学習されるクロスリンガルアーキテクチャに基づいています。 我々は、(i)このモデルが類型を利用するのを防ぐことは、パフォーマンスを著しく低下させる一方で、対照実験は、(ii)類型に従って共有を奨励することは、パフォーマンスをある程度改善することを再確認することを示している。', 'hi': 'उच्च और निम्न-संसाधन भाषाओं के बीच प्रदर्शन अंतर को पाटना बहुत पिछले काम का ध्यान केंद्रित किया गया है। वर्ल्ड एटलस ऑफ लैंग्वेज स्ट्रक्चर्स (WALS) जैसे डेटाबेस से टाइपोलॉजिकल विशेषताएं इसके लिए एक प्रमुख उम्मीदवार हैं, क्योंकि इस तरह के डेटा बहुत कम संसाधन वाली भाषाओं के लिए भी मौजूद हैं। हालांकि, पिछले काम में केवल टाइपोलॉजिकल जानकारी का उपयोग करने से मामूली लाभ मिले हैं। हमारी परिकल्पना यह है कि एक क्रॉस-लिंगुअल सेटिंग में प्रशिक्षित एक मॉडल इनपुट डेटा से टाइपोलॉजिकल संकेतों पर उठाएगा, इस प्रकार इस तरह की विशेषताओं का स्पष्ट रूप से उपयोग करने की उपयोगिता को कवर करेगा। हम टाइपोलॉजिकल जानकारी के लिए एक मॉडल को अंधा करके इस परिकल्पना को सत्यापित करते हैं, और जांच करते हैं कि क्रॉस-लिंगुअल साझाकरण और प्रदर्शन कैसे प्रभावित होता है। हमारा मॉडल एक क्रॉस-लिंगुअल आर्किटेक्चर पर आधारित है जिसमें भाषाओं के बीच साझाकरण को नियंत्रित करने वाले अव्यक्त वजन प्रशिक्षण के दौरान सीखे जाते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि (i) इस मॉडल को टाइपोलॉजी का शोषण करने से रोकने से प्रदर्शन को गंभीर रूप से कम कर देता है, जबकि एक नियंत्रण प्रयोग पुष्टि करता है कि (ii) टाइपोलॉजी के अनुसार साझा करने को प्रोत्साहित करना कुछ हद तक प्रदर्शन में सुधार करता है।', 'ru': 'Сокращение разрыва между языками с высоким и низким объемом ресурсов было в центре внимания многих предыдущих работ. Типологические особенности таких баз данных, как Всемирный атлас языковых структур (WALS), являются основным кандидатом на это, поскольку такие данные существуют даже для языков с очень ограниченными ресурсами. Однако в ходе предыдущей работы были выявлены лишь незначительные преимущества использования типологической информации. Наша гипотеза заключается в том, что модель, обученная в межъязыковой среде, будет воспринимать типологические сигналы из входных данных, тем самым затмевая полезность явного использования таких признаков. Мы проверяем эту гипотезу, скрывая модель от типологической информации, и исследуем, как это влияет на межязыковое общение и производительность. Наша модель основана на кросс-лингвистической архитектуре, в которой скрытые веса, регулирующие обмен между языками, изучаются во время обучения. Мы показываем, что (i) предотвращение использования типологии в этой модели значительно снижает производительность, в то время как контрольный эксперимент подтверждает, что (ii) поощрение совместного использования в соответствии с типологией несколько улучшает производительность.', 'ga': 'Díríodh i mórán oibre roimhe seo ar dhúnadh na bearna feidhmíochta idir teangacha ard-acmhainne agus teangacha íseal-acmhainne. Tá gnéithe tíopeolaíochta ó bhunachair shonraí ar nós Atlas Domhanda na Struchtúir Teanga (WALS) ina n-iarrthóirí príomha chuige seo, mar go bhfuil sonraí dá leithéid ann fiú do theangacha an-íseal acmhainní. Mar sin féin, níor aimsíodh in obair roimhe seo ach buntáistí beaga as úsáid a bhaint as faisnéis tíopeolaíochta. Is é an hipitéis atá againn ná go bhfaighidh samhail oilte i suíomh tras-teangach leideanna tíopeolaíochta ó na sonraí ionchuir, agus ar an gcaoi sin déanfar scáthú ar an bhfóntas a bhaineann le gnéithe den sórt sin a úsáid go sainráite. Déanaimid an hipitéis seo a fhíorú trí shamhail a dhalladh ar fhaisnéis tíopeolaíochta, agus fiosrú a dhéanamh ar an tionchar a bhíonn ag comhroinnt agus ar fheidhmíocht thrastheangach. Tá ár múnla bunaithe ar ailtireacht thrastheangach ina bhfoghlaimítear na meáchain folaigh a rialaíonn roinnt teangacha le linn na hoiliúna. Léirímid (i) go laghdaítear feidhmíocht go mór trí chosc a chur ar an tsamhail seo ó shaothrú na tíopeolaíochta, agus athdhearbhaíonn turgnamh rialaithe go (ii) feabhsaítear feidhmíocht beagán trí spreagadh a thabhairt do roinnt de réir na tíopeolaíochta.', 'el': 'Η γεφύρωση του χάσματος επιδόσεων μεταξύ γλωσσών υψηλών και χαμηλών πόρων υπήρξε το επίκεντρο πολλών προηγούμενων εργασιών. Τυπολογικά χαρακτηριστικά από βάσεις δεδομένων όπως ο Παγκόσμιος Άτλας Γλωσσικών Δομών (WALS) είναι ένας βασικός υποψήφιος για αυτό, καθώς τέτοια δεδομένα υπάρχουν ακόμη και για γλώσσες με πολύ χαμηλούς πόρους. Ωστόσο, η προηγούμενη εργασία βρήκε μόνο μικρά οφέλη από τη χρήση τυπολογικών πληροφοριών. Η υπόθεσή μας είναι ότι ένα μοντέλο εκπαιδευμένο σε ένα γλωσσικό περιβάλλον θα πάρει τυπολογικές ενδείξεις από τα δεδομένα εισόδου, επισκιάζοντας έτσι τη χρησιμότητα της ρητής χρήσης τέτοιων χαρακτηριστικών. Επιβεβαιώνουμε αυτή την υπόθεση τυφλώνοντας ένα μοντέλο σε τυπολογικές πληροφορίες και διερευνούμε πώς επηρεάζεται η γλωσσική κοινή χρήση και η απόδοση. Το μοντέλο μας βασίζεται σε μια γλωσσική αρχιτεκτονική στην οποία τα λανθάνοντα βάρη που διέπουν την κατανομή μεταξύ γλωσσών μαθαίνονται κατά τη διάρκεια της εκπαίδευσης. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι (i) η παρεμπόδιση αυτού του μοντέλου από την αξιοποίηση της τυπολογίας μειώνει σημαντικά την απόδοση, ενώ ένα πείραμα ελέγχου επιβεβαιώνει ότι (ii) η ενθάρρυνση της κοινής χρήσης σύμφωνα με την τυπολογία βελτιώνει κάπως την απόδοση.', 'hu': 'A nagy és alacsony erőforrású nyelvek közötti teljesítménykülönbség áthidalása sok korábbi munka középpontjában állt. Az olyan adatbázisokból származó tipológiai jellemzők, mint a Nyelvi Struktúrák Világalasza (WALS) kiváló jelölt erre, mivel ilyen adatok még a nagyon alacsony forrású nyelvek esetében is léteznek. A korábbi munkák azonban csak kisebb előnyöket találtak a tipológiai információk használatából. Hipotézisünk szerint egy többnyelvű beállításban képzett modell tipológiai jeleket fog felvenni a beviteli adatokból, így elhomályosítva az ilyen funkciók kifejezetten használatának hasznosságát. Ezt a hipotézist azáltal ellenőrizzük, hogy elvakítjuk a modellt tipológiai információkra, és megvizsgáljuk, hogy milyen hatással van a többnyelvű megosztásra és a teljesítményre. Modellünk egy többnyelvű architektúrán alapul, amelyben a nyelvek közötti megosztást szabályozó látens súlyokat tanuljuk a képzés során. Megmutatjuk, hogy (i) a modell tipológia kihasználásának megakadályozása súlyosan csökkenti a teljesítményt, míg egy kontrollkísérlet megerősíti, hogy (ii) a tipológia szerinti megosztás ösztönzése némileg javítja a teljesítményt.', 'ka': 'მნიშვნელოვანი სამუშაო მუშაო სამუშაო ენების შორის გადაწყვება იყო მნიშვნელოვანი სამუშაო მუშაო სამუშაო. ტიპოლოგიური ფუნქციები, როგორც მსოფლიო ენის სტრუქტურების ატლასი (WALS) პირველი კანდიდეტია, რადგან ასეთი მონაცემები ძალიან მარტივი რესურსის ენებისთვის არსებობ მაგრამ, წინა სამუშაო მხოლოდ ტიპოლოგიური ინფორმაციის გამოყენებისგან მცირე გამოიყენება. ჩვენი ჰიპოტეზეზა არის, რომ მრავალური ენგუფიკაციის მონაცემების მოდელეზაცია იქნება ტიპოლოგიური ინფორმაციების მონაცემების შესახებ, რომლებიც ასეთი ინფორმაციების გამოყენებაზე გადა ჩვენ დავწერეთ ეს ჰიპოტეზა, რაიპოლოგიური ინფორმაციისთვის მოდელს დაბრუნდეთ, და განსხვავებთ თუ როგორ მრავალური საზოგადოება და მუშაობა იქნება ჩვენი მოდელი უფრო ენგური აქტიქტურაზე დაბაზიან, რომელიც ლატენტური სიმაღლეები, რომელიც განმავლობაში ენგების შორის გაყოფილი, სწავლის განმავლობაში. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ i) ამ მოდელს ტიპოლოგიის გამოყენებას ძალიან უფრო შემცირებს გამოყენებას, მაგრამ კონტროლური ექსპერიმენტი დაახლოებით, რომ ii) ტიპოლოგიის განმავლობაზე გაუფრო', 'it': "Colmare il divario di prestazioni tra linguaggi ad alta e bassa risorsa è stato al centro di molti lavori precedenti. Le caratteristiche tipologiche provenienti da database come l'Atlante mondiale delle strutture linguistiche (WALS) sono un candidato privilegiato per questo, in quanto tali dati esistono anche per lingue a bassissimo contenuto di risorse. Tuttavia, i lavori precedenti hanno trovato solo piccoli benefici dall'uso di informazioni tipologiche. La nostra ipotesi è che un modello addestrato in un ambiente cross-lingual rilevi i segnali tipologici dai dati di input, mettendo in ombra l'utilità di utilizzare esplicitamente tali funzionalità. Verifichiamo questa ipotesi accecando un modello alle informazioni tipologiche, e indaghiamo come la condivisione e le prestazioni cross-lingual sono influenzate. Il nostro modello si basa su un'architettura multilingue in cui i pesi latenti che regolano la condivisione tra le lingue vengono appresi durante la formazione. Mostriamo che (i) impedire a questo modello di sfruttare la tipologia riduce notevolmente le prestazioni, mentre un esperimento di controllo ribadisce che (ii) incoraggiare la condivisione secondo la tipologia migliora in qualche modo le prestazioni.", 'kk': 'Жоғары мен төменгі ресурс тілдерінің ортасындағы әрекеттердің арасындағы аралығын бөлу - алдыңғы жұмысының назары. Дүйнің атласы тіл құрылғылары (WALS) секілді деректер қорларының типтологиялық қасиеттері бұл үшін негізгі кандидаты, себебі бұл деректер өте төмен ресурс тілдерінде де де бар. Бірақ алдыңғы жұмыс тек типтологиялық мәліметті пайдалануға арналған. Біздің гипотезиямыз, көптілікті баптау үлгісі келтірілген мәліметтерден типтологиялық белгілерді алып тастайды, сондықтан бұл мүмкіндіктердің утилитасын өзгертуге болады. Біз бұл гипотезаны типтологиялық мәліметтің үлгісін көтеріп, тілікті ортақтастыру және істеу нәтижесін тексеріп тұрамыз. Біздің үлгіміз тілдерді ортақтастыру үшін көптеген архитектурасына негізделген. Біз бұл үлгісін типтологияны қолдану үшін қиын қысқартуға болады дегенді көрсетедік, бірақ басқару тәжірибесі i i) типтологияның ортақтастыруды қайта құптайды.', 'ms': 'Menyelamatkan jarak prestasi antara bahasa sumber tinggi dan rendah telah menjadi fokus kerja yang lama. Ciri-ciri tipologi dari pangkalan data seperti Atlas Dunia Struktur Bahasa (WALS) adalah calon utama untuk ini, kerana data tersebut wujud walaupun untuk bahasa sumber yang sangat rendah. Namun, kerja sebelumnya hanya mendapati keuntungan kecil daripada menggunakan maklumat tipologi. Hipotesis kami adalah bahawa model yang dilatih dalam seting saling bahasa akan mengambil pada isyarat tipologi dari data input, sehingga melebihi utiliti menggunakan ciri-ciri tersebut secara eksplicit. Kami mengesahkan hipotesis ini dengan membutakan model kepada maklumat tipologi, dan menyelidiki bagaimana perkongsian dan prestasi saling bahasa dipengaruhi. Model kita berdasarkan arkitektur saling bahasa di mana berat tersembunyi yang mengendalikan perkongsian antara bahasa telah belajar semasa latihan. Kami menunjukkan bahawa (i) mencegah model ini daripada mengeksploitasi tipologi mengurangkan prestasi secara berat, sementara eksperimen kawalan mengesahkan bahawa (ii) menyokong berkongsi menurut tipologi agak meningkatkan prestasi.', 'ml': 'ഉയരത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള പ്രദര്\u200dശനത്തിന്റെ വ്യത്യാസം കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നത് മ ലോകത്തിന്റെ ആറ്റ്ലാസ് സ്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്ടറുകള്\u200d (WALS) പോലുള്ള ഡേറ്റാബേസുകളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ടൈപോളിക്കല്\u200d വിശേഷങ്ങള്\u200d ഇതിനുവേണ്ടി പ്രധ എന്നാലും മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലി ടൈപ്പോളിക്കല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും ചെറിയ ഉപകാരങ്ങള നമ്മുടെ ഹൈപ്പിറ്റീസിയസ് എന്താണെന്നാല്\u200d ക്രിസ്ലിങ്ങില്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് ഡേറ്റാകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ടൈപ്പോളിക്ക് ക ടൈപ്പോളിക്കല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു മാതൃകയെ കാണാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ ഹൈപ്പിത്യൂസിയെ പരിശോധിക്കുകയും, ക്രിസ്ലിങ്ങ് ഭാഷ പങ്കുചേ നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ഒരു ക്രിസ്ലിങ്ങ് ഭാഷയുടെ പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സമയത്ത് പഠിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ക്രിസ്ലിങ്കേല്\u200d ആര്\u200dക് ടൈപ്പോളജിയെ ഉപയോഗിക്കാതിരിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്ന് ഈ മോഡല്\u200d തടസ്സപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. ഒരു നിയന്ത്രണ പരീക്ഷണം പ', 'mt': 'Bridging the performance gap between high- and low-resource languages has been the focus of much previous work.  Typological features from databases such as the World Atlas of Language Structures (WALS) are a prime candidate for this, as such data exists even for very low-resource languages.  Madankollu, ix-xogħol preċedenti sab biss benefiċċji minuri mill-użu ta’ informazzjoni tipoloġika. L-ipoteżi tagħna hija li mudell imħarreġ f’ambjent translingwistiku se jerġa’ jikseb sinjali tipoloġiċi mid-dejta tal-input, u b’hekk jinżel l-utilità tal-użu espliċitu ta’ dawn il-karatteristiċi. Aħna nivverifikaw din l-ipoteżi billi ngħaqdu mudell għal informazzjoni tipoloġika, u ninvestigaw kif il-kondiviżjoni u l-prestazzjoni translingwistiċi huma affettwati. Il-mudell tagħna huwa bbażat fuq arkitettura translingwistika li fiha l-piżijiet latenti li jirregolaw il-qsim bejn il-lingwi jitgħallmu waqt it-taħriġ. Aħna nuru li (i) il-prevenzjoni ta’ dan il-mudell milli jisfrutta t-tipoloġija tnaqqas b’mod sever il-prestazzjoni, filwaqt li esperiment ta’ kontroll jafferma mill-ġdid li (ii) l-inkoraġġiment tal-kondiviżjoni skont it-tipoloġija jtejjeb xi ftit il-prestazzjoni.', 'lt': 'Daugelis ankstesnių darbų sutelkė dėmesį į veiksmingumo skirtumų tarp didelių ir mažai išteklių turinčių kalbų mažinimą. Tokių duomenų bazių tipologiniai požymiai, pavyzdžiui, Pasaulio kalbų struktūrų atlasas (WALS), yra pagrindinis kandidatas, nes tokie duomenys egzistuoja net ir labai mažai išteklių turinčiomis kalbomis. Tačiau ankstesniame darbe nustatyta tik nedidelė nauda naudojant tipologinę informaciją. Mūsų hipotezė yra ta, kad model is, mokytas tarpkalbinėje aplinkoje, pasiims tipologinius įrodymus iš įvestų duomenų, taigi nuslėps galimybę aiškiai naudoti tokias savybes. We verify this hypothesis by blinding a model to typological information, and investigate how cross-lingual sharing and performance is impacted.  Mūsų model is grindžiamas tarpkalbine architektūra, kurioje mokymo metu mokomas latentinis svoris, reglamentuojantis kalbų pasidalijimą. Mes parodome, kad i) užkirsti kelią šiam modeliui naudoti tipologiją smarkiai mažina veiklos rezultatus, o kontrolinis eksperimentas dar kartą patvirtina, kad ii) skatinant dalijimąsi pagal tipologiją šiek tiek pagerina veiklos rezultatus.', 'mn': 'Өмнөх ажлын төвшин ажиллах болон бага боломжтой хэл хоорондын үйл ажиллагааны ялгааг тодорхойлж байна. Дэлхийн Atlas of Language Structures (WALS) гэх мэт өгөгдлийн сангийн хэлбэрээс хамгийн түлхүүр чанар нь үүнийг хамгийн бага боломжтой хэл дээр ч байдаг. Гэхдээ өмнөх ажил нь типтологийн мэдээллийг ашиглан бага ашиг олсон. Бидний төсөөлөл бол хэл хэлний хэлбэрээр сургалтын загвар өгөгдлийн мэдээллээс бичил загваруудыг авч ирнэ. Иймээс ийм чадваруудыг тодорхой ашиглах хэрэгцээг харуулсан. Бид энэ талаарх тодорхойлолтыг типтологийн мэдээллийн загварыг хараад хэл хуваалцах болон үйл ажиллагаанд хэрхэн нөлөөлдөг вэ гэдгийг судалж байна. Бидний загвар нь хэл хоорондын хуваалцааны хамгийн сүүлийн жин нь суралцах үед сурсан олон хэлний архитектур юм. Бид энэ загварыг хэлбэрийн судалгаагаар ашиглахын тулд ихэвчлэн үр дүнг багасгахын тулд (i) энэ загварыг тодорхойлж чаддаг. Хэрвээ контролын туршилт (ii) хэлбэрийн судалгаагаар хуваалцахын тулд үр дүнг бага', 'mk': 'Намалувањето на разликата во резултатите помеѓу јазиците со високи и ниски ресурси беше фокусот на многу претходната работа. Typological features from databases such as the World Atlas of Language Structures (WALS) are a prime candidate for this, as such data exists even for very low-resource languages.  However, previous work has only found minor benefits from using typological information.  Нашата хипотеза е дека моделот трениран во крстојазични поставувања ќе ги земе типологичките знаци од внатрешните податоци, со што ќе ја прекрие корисноста на експлицитно користење на вакви карактеристики. Ја верификуваме оваа хипотеза со заслепување на моделот на типологичките информации, и истражуваме како е влијано на меѓујазичното споделување и изведувањето. Our model is based on a cross-lingual architecture in which the latent weights governing the sharing between languages is learnt during training.  Ние покажуваме дека (i) спречувањето на овој модел да ја искористи типологијата сериозно ја намалува перформансата, додека контролниот експеримент потврдува дека (ii) охрабрувањето на споделувањето според типологијата некако ја подобрува перформансата.', 'no': 'Avbryting av avstanden mellom høg og låg ressursspråk er fokuset på mykje tidlegare arbeid. Typologiske funksjonar frå databaser som World Atlas of Language Structures (WALS) er ein primærkandidat for dette, sidan slike data finst til og med svært låg ressursspråk. Førre arbeid har imidlertid berre funne mindre fordel frå bruk av typologiske informasjon. Dette er at eit modell trent i ein krysspråk innstillingar vil henta opp typologiske teikn frå inndata, slik at du overskriver verktøyet for å bruka slike funksjonar. Vi kontrollerer denne hipotesen ved å blinda ein modell til typologisk informasjon, og undersøke korleis krysspråk deling og utvikling er påvirka. Modellen vårt er basert på ein krysspråk arkitektur der latente vekt som styrer deling mellom språk er lært under opplæring. Vi viser at i) forhindrar denne modellen frå å å bruka typologien kraftig reduserer utviklinga, mens ein kontrollseksperiment gjenoppretter at ii) påvirkar å dele etter typologikk litt forbetra utviklinga.', 'ro': 'Reducerea decalajului de performanță dintre limbile cu resurse mari și cu resurse reduse a fost punctul central al multor lucrări anterioare. Caracteristicile tipologice din baze de date, cum ar fi Atlasul Mondial al Structurilor lingvistice (WALS) sunt un candidat principal pentru acest lucru, deoarece astfel de date există chiar și pentru limbile cu resurse foarte scăzute. Cu toate acestea, lucrările anterioare au găsit doar beneficii minore din utilizarea informațiilor tipologice. Ipoteza noastră este că un model instruit într-un cadru translingvistic va prelua indicii tipologice din datele de intrare, umbrind astfel utilitatea utilizării explicite a unor astfel de caracteristici. Verificăm această ipoteză orbind un model de informații tipologice și investigăm modul în care partajarea și performanța interlingvă sunt afectate. Modelul nostru se bazează pe o arhitectură translingvistică în care greutățile latente care guvernează partajarea între limbi sunt învățate în timpul formării. Aratăm că (i) prevenirea acestui model de la exploatarea tipologiei reduce grav performanța, în timp ce un experiment de control reafirmă că (ii) încurajarea partajării în funcție de tipologie îmbunătățește oarecum performanța.', 'sr': 'Prebacivanje praznine funkcije između jezika visokog i niskog resursa bio je fokus mnogo prethodnog posla. Tipološke karakteristike iz baze podataka poput Svjetske Atlas jezičke strukture (WALS) su glavni kandidat za to, jer takvi podaci postoje čak i za jezike niske resurse. Međutim, prethodni rad je pronašao manje koristi od koristi tipoloških informacija. Naša hipoteza je da će model obučen u krstojezičkom postavljanju pokupiti tipološke znakove iz podataka o ulaznim podacima, tako prekoraèiti korisnost izravno korištenja takvih karakteristika. Potvrđujemo ovu hipotezu, slepim modelom tipoloških informacija, i istražujemo kako je uticaj na cross-lingual sharing and performance. Naš model je baziran na međujezičkoj arhitekturi u kojoj se latentna težin a upravlja dijelom jezika nauči tokom treninga. Pokazujemo da i) sprječavanje ovog model a da iskoristi tipologiju ozbiljno smanjuje učinkovitost, dok kontrolni eksperiment potvrđuje da ii) ohrabruje dijeljenje prema tipologiji malo poboljšava učinkovitost.', 'si': 'ඉහළ- සහ අඩු සම්පූර්ණ භාෂාවන් අතර ප්\u200dරභාව ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විසින් ප්\u200d ලෝක ඇත්ලාස් භාෂාව සංවිධානය (WALS) වගේ දත්ත බේස් වලින් ප්\u200dරමාණික විශේෂතාවක්, මේක සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණික ප්\u200dරධානයක්  නමුත්, කලින් වැඩේ විශේෂ තොරතුරු භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් විතරයි. අපේ විශ්වාස තමයි ක්\u200dරීස් භාෂාවික සැකසුම් වලින් ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඇතුළු දත්තෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අරගෙන යන් අපි මේ විශ්වාස පරීක්ෂා කරනවා මොඩේල් එකක් ලිපියාලෝගික තොරතුරු සඳහා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක තොරතුරු සඳහා ප්\u200dර අපේ මොඩල් එක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශාල භාෂාවක් ස්ථාපනයක් අධාරණය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ලේටින් බලයක් භාෂාවක් අතර සම අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ මොඩේල් එක ප්\u200dරවේශනය විශ්වාසයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න බැරි වෙන්න, පාලනය පරීක්ෂණයක් ආපහු ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා කියලා (i) ලි', 'pl': 'Wypełnienie luki w wydajności między językami o wysokich i niskich zasobach było głównym celem wielu wcześniejszych prac. Cechy typologiczne z baz danych, takich jak Światowy Atlas struktur językowych (WALS), są do tego głównym kandydatem, ponieważ takie dane istnieją nawet w przypadku języków bardzo niskich zasobów. Jednak poprzednie prace odkryły jedynie niewielkie korzyści z wykorzystania informacji typologicznych. Nasza hipoteza jest taka, że model trenowany w ustawieniu wielojęzycznym będzie odbierał wskazówki typologiczne z danych wejściowych, przyćmiając tym samym użyteczność wyraźnego wykorzystania takich cech. Weryfikujemy tę hipotezę, oślepiając model na informacje typologiczne i badamy, w jaki sposób wpływa na dzielenie się między językami i wydajność. Nasz model opiera się na architekturze wielojęzycznej, w której podczas szkolenia uczy się ukrytych wag regulujących dzielenie się między językami. Pokazujemy, że (i) zapobieganie wykorzystaniu typologii tego modelu znacznie zmniejsza wydajność, podczas gdy eksperyment kontrolny potwierdza, że (ii) zachęcanie do dzielenia się według typologii nieco poprawia wydajność.', 'sv': 'Att överbrygga prestandaklyftan mellan språk med hög och låg resurs har varit fokus i mycket tidigare arbete. Typologiska egenskaper från databaser som World Atlas of Language Structures (WALS) är en utmärkt kandidat för detta, eftersom sådana data finns även för språk med mycket låg resurs. Tidigare arbete har dock endast funnit mindre fördelar med att använda typologisk information. Vår hypotes är att en modell tränad i en tvärspråkig inställning kommer att plocka upp typologiska ledtrådar från indata data, vilket överskuggar nyttan av att uttryckligen använda sådana funktioner. Vi verifierar denna hypotes genom att förblinda en modell för typologisk information, och undersöker hur tvärspråklig delning och prestanda påverkas. Vår modell bygger på en tvärspråklig arkitektur där de latenta vikterna som styr språkdelningen lärs sig under träningen. Vi visar att (i) förhindra denna modell från att utnyttja typologi kraftigt minskar prestandan, medan ett kontrollexperiment bekräftar att (ii) uppmuntra delning enligt typologi förbättrar prestandan något.', 'ta': 'உயர் மற்றும் குறைந்த மூலத்தின் மொழிகளுக்கிடையே செயல்பாட்டு வேறுபாட்டை பிரித்து முந்தைய வேலையின்  உலக அட்லாஸ் மொழி அமைப்புகள் (WALS) போன்ற தரவுத்தளங்களிலிருந்து தரவுத்தளங்களின் குணங்கள் மிகவும் குறைந்த மூலங்களுக்கும் தரவு உள்ளது. ஆனால், முந்தைய வேலை வழக்கமான தகவலை பயன்படுத்தி சிறிய பயன்பாடுகள் மட்டும் காணவில்லை. எங்கள் துப்பாக்கியம் என்னவென்றால், ஒரு மொழி அமைப்பில் பயிற்சி ஒரு மாதிரி உள்ளீட்டு தரவிலிருந்து வகையான கூம்களை எடுத்துக் கொள்ளும், அதனால் இத நாம் இந்த hypothesis சரிபார்ப்போம் ஒரு மாதிரி வகையான தகவலை குருட்டி பார்க்க, மற்றும் மொழியில் பகிர்ந்து மற்றும் செயல்பாடு  எங்கள் மாதிரி ஒரு மொழி உருவாக்கத்தை அடிப்படையில் உள்ளது பயிற்சியில் பங்கிடுதல் மொழிகளுக்கிடையில் கட்டுப்படுத்தும நாம் (நான்) இந்த மாதிரி வகைப்பட்டியலை பயன்படுத்தாமல் தடுக்கும் முறையை கடுமையாக குறைக்கும், ஆனால் ஒரு கட்டுப்பாட்டு சோதனையின் முயற்சி செயல்பாட', 'so': 'Horumarinta muuqashada oo kala duduwanaya luqadaha sare iyo hoose-resource waa mid aad u fiirsan karta shaqada hore. Tipological features from databases such as the World Atlas of Language Structures (WALS) are the prime candidate for tan, sida tusaale ahaan macluumaadka waxaa jira xataa luuqado aad u yar. Si kastaba ha ahaatee shaqada hore waxaa laga helay manfacyo yar oo kaliya isticmaalka macluumaadka caafimaadka ah. Fiiniyadeena waa in tusaale lagu tababariyey qoraalka luuqadaha kala duwan ayaa ka soo qaadan kara macluumaadka injiilka, sidaa darteed waxaa kor u qaadan kara isticmaalka waxyaabaha cayiman ah. Waxaynu xaqiijinnaa fikradan si aan u indho tusaale u dhigno macluumaadka isticmaalka, waxaana baaraynaa siduu saameyn ugu yeelan karo sharciga luuqadaha kala duwan iyo sameynta. Tusaale ahaan waxaa ku saleysan dhismaha luuqadaha kala duduwan, taasoo lagu baro miisaanka ugu dambeeya oo ku saabsan sharciga luuqadaha kala duwan. Waxan tusnaynaa in qaababkan ka hortagga isticmaalka qoraalka uu si adag u hoosaysiiyo tababarka, laakiin baaritaanka kontrollka ayaa dhab u dhigaya in (i i) ku dhiirrigeliyo sharciga sida qoraalka loo qoray ay ay u horumariyo tababarka.', 'ur': 'بہت سے اگلے کام کا مطابق ہے کہ عملکرد فاصلہ بالا اور کم رسسوس زبانوں کے درمیان تغییر کرنا ہے. ایسے ڈاٹ بیس کے ٹیپٹولوژیکوں کی خصوصیات جیسے World Atlas of Language Structures (WALS) اس کے لئے ایک نہایت منظور ہیں، کیونکہ ایسی ڈاٹ بہت کم منظور زبانوں کے لئے بھی موجود ہے. لیکن اگلے کام صرف تایپولوژیک معلومات کے مطابق کم فائدہ پایا ہے۔ ہماری فرضی یہ ہے کہ ایک مختلف زبان تنظیمات میں آموزش کی ایک مدل ایسی طرح کے ذریعہ سے اپنا انتشار اٹھائے گی، اس طرح اس طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح ہم اس فرضی کی تصدیق کر رہے ہیں تایپولوژیکی معلومات کے ذریعہ ایک مدل کو اندھا کر دیتے ہیں اور ان کی تحقیق کریں کہ کیسے کروسٹی زبان شریک اور عملکرد اثر دیتی ہے. ہمارا مدل ایک مختلف زبان معماری پر بنیاد ہے جس میں لٹینٹ وزن جو زبانوں کے درمیان شریک کرنے کی حکومت کرتی ہے تعلیم کے وقت سکھائی جاتی ہے ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ (i) اس مدل کو تایپولوژی کے مطابق سخت کم کرنے سے روکتے ہیں، حالانکہ ایک کنٹرول آزمائش دوبارہ تصدیق کرتا ہے کہ (ii) تایپولوژی کے مطابق تقسیم کرنے کی سزا تھوڑی سی طرح کامیابی اضافہ کرتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Name Name Lekin oldingi ishda oddiy maʼlumot yordamida faqat kichkina foydalanuvchi topildi. Bizning fikrimiz, har bir tillar o'rtasida o'rganilgan modeli kiritish maʼlumotlaridan typologik xususiyatlarni olib tashlaydi, shunday qilib bu xususiyatlarni shaxsiy foydalanish qo'llashadi. Biz bu hypotheyasini tizimga yordam maʼlumotni ko'rishimiz mumkin, va har bir tillar bilan bog'lash va bajarish qanday qo'llaniladi. Bizning modelimiz bir necha tillar arxituvlari asosida, bu yerda tillar orasidagi bir necha qismlarni o'rganish paytida o'rganadi. We show that (i) preventing this model from exploiting typology severely reduces performance, while a control experiment reaffirms that (ii) encouraging sharing according to typology somewhat improves performance.", 'vi': 'Sự bù đắp khoảng cách giữa ngôn ngữ cao và thấp nguồn đã được tập trung vào nhiều công việc trước đây. Đặc điểm phát ngôn từ các cơ sở dữ liệu như World Atlas of Languagestructures (WAFS). Tuy nhiên, công việc trước chỉ tìm thấy lợi ích nhỏ từ việc sử dụng thông tin đánh máy. Theo giả thuyết của chúng tôi, một mô hình được đào tạo trong một thiết lập ngôn ngữ khác nhau sẽ bắt đầu bằng những dấu hiệu đánh vần từ dữ liệu nhập vào, và làm tối ưu tiện sử dụng trực tiếp các tính năng đó. Chúng tôi xác minh giả thuyết này bằng cách đóng giả một mô hình để đưa ra thông tin đánh máy, và điều tra xem ảnh hưởng của việc chia sẻ ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Mô hình của chúng tôi dựa trên một kiến trúc ngôn ngữ khác nhau nơi tập luyện tập các trọng lượng phụ thuộc vào việc chia sẻ ngôn ngữ. Chúng tôi cho thấy: i) ngăn cản mô hình này khai thác các loại học nghiêm trọng giảm hiệu suất, trong khi một thử nghiệm kiểm soát xác định lại rằng', 'bg': 'Премахването на разликата в ефективността между езиците с висок и нисък ресурс беше фокусът на много предишни работи. Типологични характеристики от бази данни като Световния атлас на езиковите структури (WALS) са основен кандидат за това, тъй като такива данни съществуват дори и за езици с много ниски ресурси. Въпреки това, предишни работи са открили само незначителни ползи от използването на типологична информация. Нашата хипотеза е, че модел, обучен в междуезична обстановка, ще възприеме типологични знаци от входните данни, като по този начин ще засенчи полезността на изричното използване на такива функции. Проверяваме тази хипотеза, като заслепяваме модела за типологична информация и изследваме как междуезичното споделяне и представяне се влияят. Нашият модел се основава на междуезична архитектура, в която латентните тежести, управляващи споделянето между езиците, се научават по време на обучението. Показваме, че (i) предотвратяването на този модел да използва типологията значително намалява производителността, докато контролен експеримент потвърждава, че (ii) насърчаването на споделянето според типологията донякъде подобрява производителността.', 'da': 'At bygge bro over præstationskløften mellem sprog med høj og lav ressource har været fokus i meget tidligere arbejde. Typologiske træk fra databaser som World Atlas of Language Structures (WALS) er en førsteklasses kandidat til dette, da sådanne data findes selv for meget lave ressourcer sprog. Tidligere arbejde har imidlertid kun fundet mindre fordele ved at bruge typologiske oplysninger. Vores hypotese er, at en model trænet i en tværsproget indstilling vil opfange typologiske signaler fra input data, hvilket overskygger nytten af eksplicit at bruge sådanne funktioner. Vi bekræfter denne hypotese ved at blinde en model for typologisk information, og undersøger, hvordan tværsproget deling og ydeevne påvirkes. Vores model er baseret på en tværsproget arkitektur, hvor de latente vægte, der styrer fordelingen mellem sprog, læres under træningen. Vi viser, at (i) at forhindre denne model i at udnytte typologi kraftigt reducerer ydeevnen, mens et kontroleksperiment bekræfter, at (ii) opmuntring til deling efter typologi forbedrer ydeevnen noget.', 'de': 'Die Überbrückung der Leistungslücke zwischen Sprachen mit hohen und niedrigen Ressourcen stand im Mittelpunkt vieler vorangegangener Arbeiten. Typische Merkmale aus Datenbanken wie dem World Atlas of Language Structures (WALS) sind hierfür ein idealer Kandidat, da solche Daten auch für sehr ressourcenarme Sprachen existieren. Bisherige Arbeiten haben jedoch nur geringe Vorteile durch die Verwendung typologischer Informationen gefunden. Unsere Hypothese ist, dass ein Modell, das in einem crosslingualen Setting trainiert wird, typologische Hinweise aus den Eingabedaten aufgreift und somit den Nutzen einer expliziten Verwendung solcher Features überschattet. Wir verifizieren diese Hypothese, indem wir ein Modell für typologische Informationen blenden und untersuchen, wie sich das sprachübergreifende Teilen und die Leistung auswirken. Unser Modell basiert auf einer sprachübergreifenden Architektur, in der die latenten Gewichte für den Sprachaustausch während des Trainings gelernt werden. Wir zeigen, dass (i) das Verhindern dieses Modells, Typologie auszunutzen, die Leistung stark reduziert, während ein Kontrollexperiment bestätigt, dass (ii) die Förderung des Teilens nach Typologie die Leistung etwas verbessert.', 'nl': 'Het overbruggen van de prestatiekloof tussen high- en low-resource talen is de focus geweest van veel eerder werk. Typologische kenmerken uit databases zoals de World Atlas of Language Structures (WALS) zijn hiervoor een uitstekende kandidaat, aangezien dergelijke gegevens bestaan zelfs voor zeer lage resource talen. Eerder onderzoek heeft echter slechts geringe voordelen gevonden van het gebruik van typologische informatie. Onze hypothese is dat een model getraind in een cross-lingual setting typologische aanwijzingen uit de invoergegevens zal oppikken, waardoor het nut van expliciet gebruik van dergelijke kenmerken overschaduwd wordt. We verifiëren deze hypothese door een model te verblinden voor typologische informatie, en onderzoeken hoe cross-lingual sharing en performance worden beïnvloed. Ons model is gebaseerd op een meertalige architectuur waarin de latente gewichten die het delen van talen bepalen tijdens de training worden geleerd. We tonen aan dat (i) voorkomen dat dit model typologie gebruikt, de prestaties aanzienlijk vermindert, terwijl een controleexperiment bevestigt dat (ii) het stimuleren van delen volgens typologie de prestaties enigszins verbetert.', 'hr': 'Prekidanje praznine učinka između jezika visokog i niskog resursa bio je fokus mnogo prethodnog rada. Typološke karakteristike iz baze podataka poput Svjetske Atlas jezičke strukture (WALS) za to su glavni kandidat, jer takvi podaci postoje čak i za jezike niske resurse. Međutim, prethodni rad pronašao je samo manje koristi od koristi tipoloških informacija. Naša hipoteza je da će model obučen u krstojezičkom postavljanju pokupiti tipološke znakove iz podataka o ulaznim podacima, tako prekrivajući korisnost izravno koristeći takve znakove. Potvrđujemo ovu hipotezu sljepćenjem model a tipoloških informacija i istražujemo kako se utiče na cross-lingual sharing and performance. Naš model se temelji na međujezičkoj arhitekturi u kojoj se nalazi latentna težin a koja upravlja dijelom jezika tijekom treninga. Pokazujemo da i) sprječavanje ovog model a da iskoristi tipologiju ozbiljno smanjuje učinkovitost, dok kontrolni eksperiment potvrđuje da ii) ohrabrujući dijeljenje prema tipologiji malo poboljšava učinkovitost.', 'id': 'Mengurangi jarak prestasi antara bahasa-bahasa yang tinggi dan rendah sumber daya telah menjadi fokus dari banyak pekerjaan sebelumnya. Karakteristik tipologi dari pangkalan data seperti Atlas Dunia Struktur Bahasa (WALS) adalah kandidat utama untuk hal ini, karena data tersebut ada bahkan untuk bahasa yang sangat rendah sumber daya. Namun, pekerjaan sebelumnya hanya menemukan manfaat kecil dari menggunakan informasi tipologi. Hipotesis kami adalah bahwa model yang dilatih dalam pengaturan saling bahasa akan mengambil pada tanda tipologi dari data input, sehingga menyembunyikan utilitas menggunakan ciri-ciri tersebut secara eksplicit. Kita mengkonfirmasi hipotesis ini dengan membutakan model untuk informasi tipologi, dan menyelidiki bagaimana berbagi dan pertunjukan bahasa saling terpengaruh. Model kita berdasarkan arsitektur saling bahasa di mana berat tertutup yang menguasai berbagi antara bahasa belajar selama latihan. Kami menunjukkan bahwa (i) mencegah model ini dari mengeksploitasi tipologi secara berat mengurangi prestasi, sementara eksperimen kontrol mengesahkan bahwa (ii) mendorong berbagi menurut tipologi agak meningkatkan prestasi.', 'ko': '고자원 언어와 저자원 언어 간의 성능 격차를 메우는 것은 줄곧 이전의 많은 업무의 중점이었다.세계언어구조지도집(WALS) 등 데이터베이스에서 나온 유형학적 특징이 이 분야의 주요 후보다. 자원이 매우 낮은 언어에도 이런 데이터가 존재하기 때문이다.그러나 이전의 작업에서는 유형 정보를 사용하는 작은 장점만 발견했다.우리의 가설은 크로스 언어 환경에서 훈련된 모델이 입력 데이터에서 유형 단서를 추출하여 이러한 특징을 명확하게 사용하는 효용을 가린다는 것이다.우리는 하나의 모델과 유형 정보를 맹화함으로써 이 가설을 검증하고 다중 언어 공유와 실적이 어떻게 영향을 받는지 연구한다.우리의 모델은 다중 언어 체계 구조를 바탕으로 하는데 그 중에서 언어 간의 공유를 통제하는 잠재적 권한은 훈련 기간에 학습하는 것이다.우리는 (i)가 이런 모델을 이용하여 유형을 습득하여 성능을 심각하게 떨어뜨리는 것을 막았고, 제어 실험은 (ii)가 유형학에 따라 공유를 장려하면 어느 정도 성능을 향상시킬 수 있다는 것을 재확인했다.', 'sw': 'Kuonyesha tofauti ya utendaji kati ya lugha za juu na rasilimali za chini zimekuwa muhimu wa kazi nyingi zilizopita. Tamko za kawaida kutoka kwenye databases kama vile Atlas ya Miundombinu ya Lugha (WALS) ni mgombea mkuu kwa ajili ya hili, kama vile taarifa zinakuwepo hata kwa lugha ndogo ya rasilimali. However, previous work has only found minor benefits from using typological information.  Utafiti wetu ni kwamba mtindo wa mafunzo katika mazingira ya lugha mbalimbali utachukua vifaa vya kawaida kutoka kwenye taarifa za input, kwa hiyo unavuka matumizi ya wazi kwa kutumia vipengele hivi. Tunatathibitisha nadharia hii kwa kuzuia muundo wa taarifa za kawaida, na kuchunguza jinsi ushirikiano na utendaji wa lugha tofauti unavyoathirika. Mfano wetu umejikita na ujenzi wa lugha mbalimbali ambapo mizigo ya hivi karibuni yanayohusu ushirikiano kati ya lugha zinajifunza wakati wa mafunzo. Tunaonyesha kwamba (mimi) kuzuia muundo huu kutokutumia mtindo wa aina hii kwa kiasi kikubwa kupunguza ufanisi, wakati jaribio la udhibiti linasisitiza kuwa (i i) kuhamasisha kushirikiana kwa mujibu wa utamaduni unaorodhesha utendaji.', 'tr': 'Görniş gapysyny ýokary we düşük resurslar dilleriniñ arasynda süýtgetmek üçin öňki iş üçin fokus edildi. Dünýä Atlas dil strukturlary ýaly hatlaryň (WALS) sanly hatlaryň üst kandidatdyr, sebäbi hatlaryň gaty düşük ressurs dilleri üçin hem bar. Ýöne öňki işe diňe tipologik maglumatlary ulanmakdan azajyk täsirler tapdy. Biziň ýagdaýymyz şudyr ki, çarp-dilli düzümlerde bilim sistemasynda bilim sistemasy girdi maglumatyndan typolojik cuerdan alacak, şonuň üçin bu şekilde birnäçe çykyşlyklary ulanmakdan başarmaýar. Biz bu hökmüni tipologik maglumatlara kör etýän bir nusgany çykaryp barýarys we bu hökmü çykaryp dil paylaşma we işlemler nädip täsirli etýändigini barlaýarys. Biziň modelimiz çarpaz diller arhitekturyna daýanýar, bu ýerde edil diller arasynda paylaşma üçin öwrenip otyran iň kiçijik arhitekturlygymyz bar. Biz bu nusgany tipologiýany ulanmakdan çykarmakdan çykarýarys, bir kontrol synagynyň täzeden (i i) typologiýa ýaly paylaşma täsirini biraz gowurarak diýip kabul edip bilýäris.', 'fa': 'تغییر فاصله عملکرد بین زبانهای بالا و کم منابع تمرکز بسیاری از کارهای قبلی است. ویژگی\u200cهای نوع\u200cشناسی از پایگاه\u200cهای داده\u200cها مانند ساختار زبان جهانی آتلس (WALS) یک کاندیدای اولیه برای این است، چون این داده حتی برای زبان\u200cهای بسیار کم منبع وجود دارد. ولی کار قبلی تنها سودی کمی از استفاده از اطلاعات تایپ\u200cلوژیک پیدا کرده است. فرض ما این است که یک مدل آموزش یافته در تنظیمات متوسط زبان بر نشانه\u200cهای نوع\u200cشناسی از داده\u200cهای ورودی می\u200cگیرد، بنابراین از استفاده از این ویژه\u200cها به طور کامل غیر قابل تحقیق می\u200cکند. ما این فرضیه را با کور کردن یک مدل برای اطلاعات تایپ\u200cلوژیکی تایید می\u200cکنیم و تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که چگونه تأثیر تقسیم کردن و عملکرد از زبان\u200cهای متفاوتی اثر می\u200cیابد. مدل ما بر اساس یک معماری متوسط زبان است که وزن latent که مدیریت مشترک بین زبانها در زمان آموزش یاد گرفته است. ما نشان می دهیم که (i) جلوگیری از این مدل از استفاده از نوع\u200cشناسی به شدت عملکرد را کاهش می\u200cدهد، در حالی که یک آزمایش کنترل تأثیر می\u200cدهد که (ii) تشویق دادن با توجه به نوع نوع\u200cشناسی عملکرد کمی بهتر می\u200cشود.', 'sq': 'Zbritja e dallimit në performancë midis gjuhëve me burime të larta dhe të ulta ka qenë fokusi i shumë punëve të mëparshme. Karakteristikat tipike nga bazat e të dhënave të tilla si Atlas Botëror i Strukturave të Gjuhave (WALS) janë një kandidat kryesor për këtë, pasi të dhënat e tilla ekzistojnë edhe për gjuhët me burime shumë të ulëta. However, previous work has only found minor benefits from using typological information.  Hipoteza jonë është se një model i stërvitur në një ambient ndërgjuhësor do të marrë në shenja tipologjike nga të dhënat e hyrjes, kështu që do të mbulojë shërbimin e përdorimit eksplicit të këtyre karakteristikave. We verify this hypothesis by blinding a model to typological information, and investigate how cross-lingual sharing and performance is impacted.  Modeli ynë është bazuar në një arkitekturë ndërgjuhësore në të cilën peshat e fshehta që rregullojnë ndarjen midis gjuhëve mësohen gjatë trajnimit. Ne tregojmë se (i) pengimi i këtij modeli nga shfrytëzimi i tipologjisë redukton rëndësisht performancën, ndërsa një eksperiment kontrolli përsërit se (ii) inkurajimi i ndarjes sipas tipologjisë përmirëson disi performancën.', 'af': "Die uitbreiding van die prestasie gap tussen hoë en lae- hulpbron tale is die fokus van baie vorige werk. Tippologiese funksies van databasis soos die Wêreld Atlas van Taal strukture (WALS) is 'n primêre kandidate vir hierdie, omdat sulke data bestaan selfs vir baie lae hulpbron tale. Maar die vorige werk het net klein voordeel gevind van tipologiese inligting te gebruik. Ons hipotesis is dat 'n model onderwerp in 'n kruistale instelling op tipologiese tekens van die invoer data sal opneem, sodat die nutsprogram van eksplisiese gebruik sodanige eienskappe. Ons bevestig hierdie hipotesis deur 'n model te blink tot tipologiese inligting, en ondersoek hoe kruistale deel en prestasie geïnvlak word. Ons model is gebaseer op 'n kruistale arkitektuur waarin die latente gewigte wat die deel tussen tale bestuur word onder opvoering. Ons wys dat (i) hierdie model voorkom om te gebruik van tipologie swaar effektiviteit te reduseer, terwyl 'n kontrole eksperiment weer bevestig dat (ii) die deel aanbevestig volgens tipologie wat effektiviteit verbeter.", 'az': 'Ən yüksək və düşük ressurs dillərinin arasındakı performans boşluğunu kəsmək əvvəlki işlərin çoxluğuna odaqlandı. Dünya Atlas Dil Yapıları (WALS) kimi verilən verilənlərin təbiətləri bunun üçün prim kandidatır, çünki bu məlumatlar çox düşük ressurs dilləri üçün hətta mövcuddur. Ancaq əvvəlki işlər typolojik məlumatları istifadə etməkdən az fayda tapar. Bizim hipotezimiz, çoxlu dil ayarlarında təhsil edilmiş modellərin girdi məlumatlarından typolojik işaretlərini alır və bu səbəbdən bu işaretləri a çıq-aydın istifadə edərək istifadə edərlər. Biz bu hipotezi tipolojik məlumatların modelini körpüşdürməklə təsdiqləyirik, çox dil paylaşılması və performansının necə təsir edildiyini təsdiqləyirik. Bizim modellərimiz dillərin paylaşmasını müəyyən edən çox dilli arhitektə dayanılır. Biz göstəririk ki, i) bu modeli tipologiya istifadə etməyi çox azaldırmağı qadağan edir, çünki bir kontrol eksperimenti ii) tipologiya ilə paylaşmağı təşkil edir.', 'hy': 'Bridging the performance gap between high- and low-resource languages has been the focus of much previous work.  Տիպոլոգիական հատկությունները տվյալների հիմքերում, ինչպիսիք են Լեզվային կառուցվածքների Համաշխարհային Ատլասը (Walls) հիմնական թեկնածուն են սրա համար, քանի որ այդ տվյալները գոյություն ունեն նույնիսկ շատ ցածր ռեսուրսների լե Այնուամենայնիվ, նախորդ աշխատանքները միայն փոքր առավելություններ են հայտնաբերել տիպոլոգիական տեղեկատվության օգտագործման համար: Մեր հիպոթեզն այն է, որ երկլեզվային միջավայրում սովորեցված մոդելը կընդունի տիպոլոգիական ազդանշանները ներմուծման տվյալներից, այսպես թաքնվելով նման առանձնահատկությունների բացատրական օգտագործման օգտակարությունը: Մենք ստուգում ենք այս հիպոթեզը՝ կույրելով տիպոլոգիական ինֆորմացիայի մոդելը և ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե ինչպես են փոխլեզուների կիսվելը և արտադրողությունը ազդում: Մեր մոդելը հիմնված է լեզվով հատվածային ճարտարապետության վրա, որտեղ լեզվի փոխանցումը կառավարող թաքնված կշիռերը սովորվում են ուսուցման ընթացքում: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ i) կանխում է այս մոդելը տիպոլոգիայի օգտագործումից խիստ նվազեցնում է արդյունքը, մինչդեռ վերահսկողական փորձը կրկին հաստատում է, որ i) խրախուսելով կիսվել ըստ տիպոլոգիայի ինչ-որ չափով բարելավ', 'ca': "La solució de la diferència de rendiment entre llengües de baix i alts recursos ha estat el foc de molta feina anterior. Característiques tipològices de bases de dades com l'Atlas Mundial de l'Estructura de Llingua (WALS) són un candidat prim per això, com aquestes dades existeixen fins i tot per llengües de baix recursos. However, previous work has only found minor benefits from using typological information.  La nostra hipòtesi és que un model entrenat en un entorn translingüístic recollirà indicacions tipològices a partir de les dades d'entrada, sobrepassant l'utilitat d'utilitzar explícitament aquestes característiques. Verifiquem aquesta hipòtesi ceguent un model a la informació tipològica, i investigam com impacten el compartiment i el rendiment translingüístics. El nostre model es basa en una arquitectura translingüística en la qual els pesos latents que governen el compartiment entre llengües s'aprenen durant l'entrenament. Mostrem que i) evitar que aquest model exploati la tipologia redueix gravement el rendiment, mentre que un experiment de control reafirma que ii) encorajar el compartiment segons la tipologia millora alguna cosa el rendiment.", 'am': 'ከፍተኛ እና ከታናሹ ምዕራፍ ቋንቋዎች መካከል የፍጥረት ግንኙነት ለመቀበል የፊተኛውን ሥራ ማዕከል ነው፡፡ የዓለም አጣሊስ የቋንቋ ሥርዓት (WALS) የሚመስል የዳታ መቀመጫዎች ለዚህ የፊደል ፈቃድ ናቸው፤ እንደዚህም ዳታ ለእጅግ በጣም ታናሽ ክፍል ቋንቋዎች እንኳ ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የቀድሞው ስራ የጥያቄ መረጃ ከመጠቀም ትንሽ ጥቅሞችን ብቻ አገኘ፡፡ በተለይ ቋንቋ ውስጥ የተማረ ምሳሌ ከጥያቄ ዳታዎች የተዘጋጀ የጥያቄ ኩነቶችን ያነሳል፡፡ የቋንቋው ማጋራት እና የቋንቋው ማጋራት እንዴት እንደሆነ እናረጋግጣለን፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን በቋንቋ መሠረት ላይ የተመሠረተ ነው፡፡ እናሳያቸዋለን (እኔ) ይህንን ምሳሌ ጦማሪያን ከመከላከል ትክክለኛውን በጭንቅ ያጎድላል፡፡ የመቆጣጠር ፈተና (i i) በትክክል ማጋራት በጥያቄ አንዳች ያሳድጋል፡፡', 'bs': 'Prekidanje praznine učinka između jezika visokog i niskog resursa bio je fokus mnogo prethodnog posla. Tipološke karakteristike iz baze podataka poput Svjetske Atlas jezičke strukture (WALS) su glavni kandidat za to, jer takvi podaci postoje čak i za jezike niske resurse. Međutim, prethodni rad je pronašao manje koristi od koristi tipoloških informacija. Naša hipoteza je da će model obučen u krstojezičkom postavljanju pokupiti tipološke znakove iz podataka o ulaznim podacima, tako prekoračiti korisnost izravno koristeći takve karakteristike. Potvrđujemo ovu hipotezu sljepćenjem model a tipoloških informacija i istražujemo kako se utiče na cross-lingual sharing and performance. Naš model je baziran na međujezičkoj arhitekturi u kojoj se nalazi latentna težin a koja upravlja dijelom jezika tokom treninga. Mi pokazujemo da i) sprječavanje ovog model a da iskoristi tipologiju ozbiljno smanjuje učinkovitost, dok kontrolni eksperiment potvrđuje da ii) poticanje podjele prema tipologiji malo poboljšava učinkovitost.', 'bn': 'Bridging the performance gap between high- and low-resource languages has been the focus of much previous work.  টাইপলোজিকিয়াল বৈশ্বিক আট্লাস অফ ভাষা কাঠামোর (ওয়ালাস) এর মতো তথ্যের বৈশিষ্ট্য, যেমন তথ্য খুব কম-সম্পদ ভাষার জন্য প্রার্থী। তবে পূর্ববর্তী কাজ শুধুমাত্র সাধারণ তথ্য ব্যবহার করে ছোট সুবিধা পেয়েছে। আমাদের ধারণা হচ্ছে যে ক্রিশ ভাষাভাষায় একটি মডেল প্রশিক্ষিত হবে ইনপুটের তথ্য থেকে টাইপোলিক কুয়ের উপর, যার ফলে এই ধরনের বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহারের ব্যবহা আমরা এই হাইপিথিসিকে নিশ্চিত করি টাইপোলিক তথ্য অন্ধকার করে এবং অনুসন্ধান করি কিভাবে ক্রিভাষাভাষী শেয়ার এবং প্রভাব প্রভাবি আমাদের মডেল একটি প্রশিক্ষণের সময় ক্রস ভাষাভাষী আর্কিকেটের উপর ভিত্তি করেছে, যেখানে ভাষার মধ্যে ভাষার শেয়ার করার সময় সাম্প্রতি আমরা দেখাচ্ছি (আমি) এই মডেল টাইপোলিজি ব্যবহার করা থেকে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ পরীক্ষা কমিয়ে দেয়ার ব্যাপারে বাধা দেয়া যাচ্ছে, আর একটি নিয়ন্ত্রণ পরীক্ষা পুনর', 'et': 'Paljude varasemate tööde keskmes on olnud tulemuslikkuse lõhe ületamine suure ja vähese ressursiga keelte vahel. Selleks on peamiseks kandidaadiks andmebaaside, nagu World Atlas of Language Structures (WALS), tüpoloogilised omadused, sest sellised andmed on olemas isegi väga vähese ressursiga keelte puhul. Varasemates töödes on tüpoloogilise teabe kasutamisest siiski leitud vaid väikest kasu. Meie hüpotees on, et keeleüleselt koolitatud mudel võtab sisendandmetest tüpoloogilisi vihjeid, varjates seega selliste funktsioonide selgesõnalise kasutamise kasulikkust. Me kontrollime seda hüpoteesi, pimestades mudeli tüpoloogilisele teabele ning uurime, kuidas mõjutab keeleülest jagamist ja jõudlust. Meie mudel põhineb keeleülesel arhitektuuril, kus koolituse käigus õpitakse keeltevahelist jagamist reguleerivaid latentseid kaalusid. Näitame, et i) selle mudeli kasutamise takistamine tüpoloogia kasutamisest vähendab oluliselt jõudlust, samas kui kontrollkatse kinnitab, et ii) tüpoloogia alusel jagamise julgustamine parandab mõnevõrra jõudlust.', 'cs': 'Překlenování výkonnostních rozdílů mezi jazyky s vysokými a nízkými zdroji bylo zaměřeno na mnoho předchozích prací. Typologické prvky z databází, jako je Světový atlas jazykových struktur (WALS), jsou pro to hlavním kandidátem, protože tato data existují i pro jazyky s velmi nízkými zdroji. Předchozí práce však našla jen menší výhody z použití typologických informací. Naší hypotézou je, že model trénovaný v cross-jazyčném prostředí vychytí z typologických podnětů ze vstupních dat, čímž zastíní užitečnost explicitního využívání těchto funkcí. Tato hypotéza ověřujeme oslepením modelu vůči typologickým informacím a zkoumáme, jak ovlivňuje mezijazyčné sdílení a výkon. Náš model je založen na mezijazyčné architektuře, ve které se během tréninku učí latentní váhy řídící sdílení mezi jazyky. Ukazujeme, že (i) bránění tomuto modelu v využívání typologie výrazně snižuje výkon, zatímco kontrolní experiment potvrzuje, že (ii) podpora sdílení podle typologie poněkud zlepšuje výkon.', 'fi': 'Monissa aikaisemmissa töissä on keskitytty suur- ja vähäresurssisten kielten suorituskykykuilun kuromiseen umpeen. Tietokantojen, kuten World Atlas of Language Structures (WALS), typologiset ominaisuudet ovat ensisijainen ehdokas tähän, koska tällaisia tietoja on olemassa jopa hyvin vähän resursseja käyttävillä kielillä. Aiemmissa tutkimuksissa typologisen tiedon käytöstä on kuitenkin löytynyt vain vähäisiä hyötyjä. Hypoteesimme on, että monikielisessä ympäristössä koulutettu malli poimii typologisia vihjeitä syötetyistä tiedoista, mikä varjostaa tällaisten ominaisuuksien nimenomaisen käytön hyödyllisyyttä. Vahvistamme tämän hypoteesin sokaisemalla mallin typologiselle tiedolle ja tutkimme, miten monikielinen jakaminen ja suorituskyky vaikuttavat. Mallimme perustuu monikieliseen arkkitehtuuriin, jossa kielten jakamista ohjaavat piilevät painot opitaan koulutuksen aikana. Osoitamme, että (i) tämän mallin estäminen hyödyntämästä typologiaa heikentää merkittävästi suorituskykyä, kun taas kontrollikokeissa vahvistetaan, että (ii) jakamisen kannustaminen typologian mukaan parantaa jonkin verran suorituskykyä.', 'sk': 'Prekinitev vrzeli v učinkovitosti med jeziki z visokimi in nizkimi viri je bila v središču veliko prejšnjega dela. Tipološke značilnosti iz baz podatkov, kot je Svetovni atlas jezikovnih struktur (WALS), so glavni kandidat za to, saj taki podatki obstajajo tudi za jezike z zelo nizkimi viri. Vendar pa so predhodna dela ugotovila le manjše koristi uporabe tipoloških informacij. Naša hipoteza je, da bo model, usposobljen v večjezičnem okolju, zaznal tipološke sledi iz vhodnih podatkov in tako zasenčil uporabnost eksplicitne uporabe teh funkcij. To hipotezo preverjamo tako, da model zaslepimo za tipološke informacije in raziskujemo, kako vplivata na medjezično delitev in uspešnost. Naš model temelji na medjezični arhitekturi, v kateri se med usposabljanjem učijo latentne uteži, ki urejajo delitev jezikov. Pokazali smo, da (i) preprečevanje izkoriščanja tipologije tega modela močno zmanjšuje učinkovitost, medtem ko kontrolni eksperiment ponovno potrjuje, da (ii) spodbujanje delitve v skladu s tipologijo nekoliko izboljšuje učinkovitost.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Layout politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Kita suposis iku kelompok kuwi model sing ditambah banter-nggambar aturan anyar tentang manut karo tipolyanog Awak dhéwé ngerti supotesi iki bakal ngupakan modèl kanggo ngerasai informasi atipèlojek, lan ujian piye basa gambar kelas-kelas karo perusahaan langgar. model dhéwé wis basa saben architecture yang karo akeh langkung liyane Awak dhéwé éntuk (i) ngêngno-ingêngé kuwi model iki ngono ngéwangi tikipol-ingêngé wisata barang nggawe gerakan kanggo ngerasar seneng pisan, sampeyan ngono ujian sing nguasar éntuk ujian (i i) ngêngé nyebutaké tarjamahan sak perusahaan langgar.', 'ha': "Aka kula da gaɓa na tafiyar da tsakanin harshen sarki da kuma ƙasan-resource, yã kasance fokus wa aikin mai yawa da ya gabata. KCharselect unicode block name Amma, aikin da ya riga ya sãmi amfani kaɗan daga amfani da information mai nauyi. Tayiyiyinmu ne da aka sanar da wani misalin wanda aka yi wa tsari cikin linguin-na'ura, zai samu kofi masu nau'i na'ura daga data za'a shiga, don haka yana rufe amfani da bayani na amfani da wannan. Kana gaskata wannan teori da za'a makanta wata misalin zuwa ma'anar littafa, kuma mu yi anar jarraba jinin sharing da fassarar-harshen. Mataimakinmu yana kan wani matsayin littafin cikin lugha mai fassara, a cikinsa ana sanar da nauyi masu yin sharrin da ke tsakanin harshen. Tuna nũna (da) ya kange wannan misalin kada ya yi amfani da nau'i mai girma, kuma sami wata jarrabi na Control yana da gaskata (ii) ya ƙara wa shararawar a bayan misãlai ko kuma ya gyara wani abu.", 'he': 'הפער ביצועים בין שפות משאבים גבוהים ומנמוכים היה המרכז של עבודה קודמת רבה. אופיינים טיפולוגיים מבסיסי נתונים כמו אטלס העולמי של מבני השפה (WALS) הם מועמד ראשון לזה, כיוון שמידע כזה קיים אפילו בשפות משאבים נמוכות מאוד. עם זאת, העבודה הקודמת מצאה רק יתרונות קטנות משימוש מידע טיפולוגי. Our hypothesis is that a model trained in a cross-lingual setting will pick up on typological cues from the input data, thus overshadowing the utility of explicitly using such features.  אנו מאשרים את ההיפתוזיה הזו על ידי עיוור מודל למידע טיפולוגי, וחקירים איך משותף וביצוע שפתיים משפיע. המודל שלנו מבוסס על ארכיטקטורה שפונית שבה המשקלים המוסתרים שמשלטים על החלוק בין שפות לומדים במהלך האימונים. אנו מראים כי (i) למנוע מהמודל הזה מנצל טיפולוגיה משפחה ברצינות ביצועים, בעוד ניסוי שליטה מאשר מחדש כי (ii) מעודד שיתוף לפי טיפולוגיה משפר קצת ביצועים.', 'bo': 'མཐོ་དང་རྫོང་ཆུང་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་དབར་གྱི་བར་སྟོང་ངེས་པར་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནི་ཧ་མའི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་དམིགས་གཏད་འདུག Typological features from databases such as the World Atlas of Language Structures (WALS) are a prime candidate for this, as such data exists even for very low-resource languages. ཡིན་ནའང་། སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་དེ་ལ་དབྱེ་བ་སྤྱོད་པའི་བརྡ་འཕྲིན་བྱེད་སྐབས་ཆུང་ཆུང་ཀུ་མ་རྙེད་ཐུབ། Our hypothesis is that a model trained in a cross-lingual setting will pick up on typological cues from the input data, thus overshadowing the utility of explicitly using such features. ང་ཚོས་དབྱེ་བ་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་གནོད་པ་ལས་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་གི་མིང་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གཞུང་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཙང་ཆ་དང་མཉམ་གྱི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་གཞུང་ལ་གཞུང་བྱས་ཡོད་པའི་ནང་གི་ཉེ་གནས་ཚད་གཞུང་གི་ཤེས་ ང་ཚོས་བརྡ་བཀོད་བྱས་ན། i) རྩིས་གཞི་འདིས་ལག་ལེན་པ་ལས་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྡན་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྟར་ཉེན་ཡོད་པ་ཞིག་གིས་དཔྱད་དབྱེ་རིག'}
{'en': 'Improving Factual Consistency Between a Response and Persona Facts', 'fr': 'Améliorer la cohérence factuelle entre une réponse et des faits personnels', 'es': 'Mejorar la coherencia de los hechos entre una respuesta y los hechos personales', 'pt': 'Melhorando a consistência factual entre uma resposta e os fatos da persona', 'ar': 'تحسين الاتساق الوقائعي بين الرد وحقائق الشخصية', 'ja': '応答とペルソナ事実の間の事実の一貫性の向上', 'zh': '崇应角事实之一致性', 'ru': 'Улучшение фактической согласованности между ответом и личностными фактами', 'hi': 'एक प्रतिक्रिया और व्यक्तित्व तथ्यों के बीच तथ्यात्मक स्थिरता में सुधार', 'ga': 'Comhsheasmhacht Fíorasach a Fheabhsú idir Freagra agus Fíricí Pearsa', 'el': 'Βελτίωση της πραγματικής συνέπειας μεταξύ απάντησης και δεδομένων προσωπικού', 'ka': 'პასუხი და პროგრამის ფექტურალური კონსტენსტის უფრო მეტირება', 'lt': 'Veiksmų nuoseklumo tarp atsako ir asmens faktų gerinimas', 'kk': 'Жауап және Дербес факттарының арасындағы фактикалық сәйкестігін жақсарту', 'mk': 'Подобрување на фактичната конзистентност помеѓу одговорот и личните факти', 'ms': 'Menembangkan Kesesuaian Fakta Antara Balasan dan Fakta Peribadi', 'hu': 'A válasz és a személyi tények közötti tényező összhang javítása', 'ml': 'പ്രതികരണം മറുപടിയും പാര്\u200dസോണ ഫാക്കുള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നതിനും തമ്മിലുള്ള ഫാക്കുള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ട', 'mt': 'It-titjib tal-konsistenza fattwali bejn ir-Rispons u l-Fatti tal-Persuna', 'mn': 'Үнэндээ хариулт болон хүний үнэний хоорондоо', 'it': 'Migliorare la coerenza dei fatti tra una risposta e fatti personali', 'no': 'Forbetra faktisk konsistens mellom ein svar og personfaktor', 'pl': 'Poprawa spójności faktycznej między odpowiedzią a faktami osobowymi', 'ro': 'Îmbunătățirea coerenței faptelor între un răspuns și faptele personale', 'sr': 'Poboljšanje činjenične konsistencije između odgovora i činjenica osobe', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සහ ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් අතර ඇතුලට වැඩි වෙන්න', 'so': 'Improvement Consistence of Factual Between Response and Persona Facts', 'sv': 'Förbättra konsekvensen mellan ett svar och personfakta', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'ایک جواب اور شخصی حقیقت کے درمیان حقیقی مشترک ترقی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tăng cường sự liên kết giữa các phái phản ứng và đảng Persona', 'hr': 'Poboljšanje činjenične konsistencije između odgovora i činjenica osobe', 'da': 'Forbedring af faktisk sammenhæng mellem et svar og personlige fakta', 'nl': 'Verbetering van de feitelijke consistentie tussen een reactie en persoonlijke feiten', 'de': 'Verbesserung der faktischen Konsistenz zwischen einer Antwort und persönlichen Fakten', 'id': 'Menembak Kesesuaian Fakta Antara Balasan dan Fakta Personal', 'ko': '응답과 캐릭터 사실 사이의 사실 일치성을 높이다', 'bg': 'Подобряване на фактическата съгласуваност между отговора и фактите за личността', 'sw': 'Improving Factual Consistency Between a Response and Persona Facts', 'fa': 'افزایش اتفاقی حقیقی بین یک جواب و حقیقت شخصی', 'tr': 'Hata we Şahsy Faýllary arasynda Faýllaryň ýeterliklerini geliştirir', 'af': "Verbeter Faktiewe Konistensie tussen 'n Antwoord en Persona Facts", 'hy': 'Արձագանքի և անհատական փաստերի միջև փաստական համապատասխանությունը բարելավելը', 'am': 'መልስ', 'bn': 'প্রতিক্রিয়া এবং পার্সোনা ফ্যাক্চুয়াল বিষয়বস্তু উন্নত করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Poboljšanje činjenične konsistencije između odgovora i činjenica osobe', 'ca': 'millorar la coherencia factual entre la resposta i els fets de la persona', 'az': 'Ňě√ľbh…ôsiz ki, cavab v…ô Persona Fayl…ôl…ôri arasńĪnda', 'sq': 'Përmirësimi i konsistencës faktike midis një reagimi dhe fakteve personale', 'cs': 'Zlepšení faktické souladu mezi reakcí a osobními fakty', 'et': 'Reaktsiooni ja isiklike faktide vahelise faktilise kooskõla parandamine', 'fi': 'Reaktion ja persoonan faktojen välisen johdonmukaisuuden parantaminen', 'jv': 'Ngawe Perintah sing beraksi sing berarti gambar barang karo Perintah', 'he': 'שיפור תואמות עובדות בין תגובה לבין עובדות אישיות', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Izboljšanje skladnosti dejstev med odzivom in osebnimi dejstvi', 'bo': 'དོན་དག་ཕྱོགས་དང་མིང་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ཚོར་འབྲེལ་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ཐུབ་པ།'}
{'en': 'Neural models for response generation produce responses that are semantically plausible but not necessarily factually consistent with facts describing the speaker’s persona. These models are trained with fully supervised learning where the objective function barely captures factual consistency. We propose to fine-tune these models by reinforcement learning and an efficient reward function that explicitly captures the consistency between a response and persona facts as well as semantic plausibility. Our automatic and human evaluations on the PersonaChat corpus confirm that our approach increases the rate of responses that are factually consistent with persona facts over its supervised counterpart while retains the language quality of responses.', 'ar': 'تنتج النماذج العصبية لتوليد الاستجابة استجابات معقولة لغويًا ولكنها ليست بالضرورة متسقة من الناحية الواقعية مع الحقائق التي تصف شخصية المتحدث. يتم تدريب هذه النماذج من خلال التعلم الخاضع للإشراف الكامل حيث بالكاد تلتقط الوظيفة الموضوعية الاتساق الواقعي. نقترح ضبط هذه النماذج بدقة من خلال التعلم المعزز ووظيفة المكافأة الفعالة التي تلتقط بوضوح الاتساق بين الاستجابة والحقائق الشخصية وكذلك المعقولية الدلالية. تؤكد تقييماتنا التلقائية والبشرية على مجموعة PersonaChat أن نهجنا يزيد من معدل الردود التي تتوافق فعليًا مع حقائق الشخصية على نظيرتها الخاضعة للإشراف مع الاحتفاظ بجودة اللغة للردود.', 'es': 'Los modelos neuronales para la generación de respuestas producen respuestas que son semánticamente plausibles, pero no necesariamente coherentes con los hechos que describen la personalidad del hablante. Estos modelos se entrenan con un aprendizaje totalmente supervisado en el que la función objetivo apenas capta la coherencia de los hechos. Proponemos afinar estos modelos mediante el aprendizaje por refuerzo y una función de recompensa eficiente que capture explícitamente la coherencia entre una respuesta y los hechos personales, así como la plausibilidad semántica. Nuestras evaluaciones automáticas y humanas en el corpus de Personachat confirman que nuestro enfoque aumenta la tasa de respuestas que son consistentes de hecho con los hechos personales sobre su contraparte supervisada, al tiempo que conserva la calidad del idioma de las respuestas.', 'pt': 'Modelos neurais para geração de respostas produzem respostas que são semanticamente plausíveis, mas não necessariamente factualmente consistentes com os fatos que descrevem a personalidade do falante. Esses modelos são treinados com aprendizado totalmente supervisionado, onde a função objetivo mal captura a consistência factual. Propomos ajustar esses modelos por meio do aprendizado por reforço e uma função de recompensa eficiente que captura explicitamente a consistência entre uma resposta e os fatos da persona, bem como a plausibilidade semântica. Nossas avaliações automáticas e humanas no corpus PersonaChat confirmam que nossa abordagem aumenta a taxa de respostas que são realmente consistentes com os fatos da persona em relação à sua contraparte supervisionada, mantendo a qualidade da linguagem das respostas.', 'fr': "Les modèles neuronaux pour la génération de réponses produisent des réponses qui sont sémantiquement plausibles mais qui ne sont pas nécessairement cohérentes sur le plan factuel avec les faits décrivant la personnalité du locuteur. Ces modèles sont entraînés avec un apprentissage entièrement supervisé où la fonction objectif capture à peine la cohérence factuelle. Nous proposons d'affiner ces modèles par un apprentissage par renforcement et une fonction de récompense efficace qui saisit explicitement la cohérence entre une réponse et des faits personnels ainsi que la plausibilité sémantique. Nos évaluations automatiques et humaines sur le corpus PersonaChat confirment que notre approche augmente le taux de réponses qui sont factuellement cohérentes avec les faits personnels par rapport à son homologue supervisé tout en conservant la qualité linguistique des réponses.", 'ja': '応答生成のためのニューラルモデルは、意味的に妥当であるが、話者のペルソナを記述する事実と事実と必ずしも一致しない応答を生成する。これらのモデルは、客観的機能が事実の一貫性をほとんど捉えない完全に監督された学習で訓練されている。これらのモデルを、強化学習と、応答とペルソナ事実との間の一貫性と意味的妥当性を明示的に捉える効率的な報酬関数によって微調整することを提案する。ペルソナチャットコーパスの自動評価と人間による評価では、当社のアプローチが、回答の言語品質を維持しながら、監督下にある対応者よりもペルソナの事実と事実に一致する回答率を高めることが確認されています。', 'zh': '应生者神经应于语义则理也,未必与言者角色同也。 尽督习之,函数几不可得一致性。 臣等建议以强化学效者奖函数以微调之,宜函数明获应角之一致性及语义合理性。 PersonaChat语料库自与人工评实,吾法增与角色实相应率,兼持其应。', 'hi': 'प्रतिक्रिया पीढ़ी के लिए तंत्रिका मॉडल उन प्रतिक्रियाओं का उत्पादन करते हैं जो शब्दार्थ रूप से प्रशंसनीय हैं लेकिन जरूरी नहीं कि वक्ता के व्यक्तित्व का वर्णन करने वाले तथ्यों के साथ तथ्यात्मक रूप से सुसंगत हों। इन मॉडलों को पूरी तरह से पर्यवेक्षित सीखने के साथ प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है जहां उद्देश्य फ़ंक्शन मुश्किल से तथ्यात्मक स्थिरता को कैप्चर करता है। हम सुदृढीकरण सीखने और एक कुशल इनाम समारोह है कि स्पष्ट रूप से एक प्रतिक्रिया और व्यक्तित्व तथ्यों के रूप में अच्छी तरह से शब्दार्थ plausibility के बीच स्थिरता पर कब्जा द्वारा इन मॉडलों को ठीक ट्यून करने का प्रस्ताव है. PersonaChat कॉर्पस पर हमारे स्वचालित और मानव मूल्यांकन इस बात की पुष्टि करते हैं कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण उन प्रतिक्रियाओं की दर को बढ़ाता है जो अपने पर्यवेक्षित समकक्ष पर व्यक्तित्व तथ्यों के साथ तथ्यात्मक रूप से संगत हैं, जबकि प्रतिक्रियाओं की भाषा की गुणवत्ता को बनाए रखता है।', 'ru': 'Нейронные модели для генерации ответа дают ответы, которые семантически правдоподобны, но не обязательно фактологически согласуются с фактами, описывающими личность говорящего. Эти модели обучаются с полностью контролируемым обучением, где целевая функция едва ли отражает фактическую последовательность. Мы предлагаем отрегулировать эти модели путем обучения подкреплению и эффективной функции вознаграждения, которая явно отражает согласованность между фактами ответа и личностями, а также семантическую правдоподобие. Наши автоматические и человеческие оценки на корпусе PersonaChat подтверждают, что наш подход увеличивает частоту ответов, которые фактически согласуются с личностными фактами, по сравнению с контролируемым аналогом, сохраняя при этом языковое качество ответов.', 'ga': 'Cruthaíonn samhlacha néaracha chun freagairtí a ghiniúint freagraí atá sochreidte go séimeantach ach nach gá go bhfuil siad comhsheasmhach go fíorasach le fíricí a chuireann síos ar phearsa an chainteora. Cuirtear oiliúint ar na samhlacha seo le foghlaim faoi mhaoirseacht iomlán nuair is ar éigean a ghabhann comhsheasmhacht fhíorasach leis an bhfeidhm oibiachtúil. Tá sé beartaithe againn na samhlacha seo a mhionchoigeartú trí fhoghlaim atreisithe agus trí fheidhm luach saothair éifeachtach a thaispeánann go follasach an chomhsheasmhacht idir freagra agus fíricí pearsantachta chomh maith le sochreidteacht shéimeantach. Deimhníonn ár meastóireachtaí uathoibríocha agus daonna ar an gcorpas PersonaChat go méadaíonn ár gcur chuige an ráta freagraí atá comhsheasmhach go fíorasach le fíricí persona thar a chontrapháirt maoirsithe agus a choimeádann cáilíocht teanga na bhfreagraí.', 'hu': 'A válasz generálására szolgáló neurális modellek olyan válaszokat hoznak létre, amelyek szemantikailag valószínűek, de nem feltétlenül összhangban vannak a beszélő személyiségét leíró tényekkel. Ezeket a modelleket teljes mértékben felügyelt tanulással képezik, ahol az objektív funkció alig ragadja meg a ténybeli következetességet. Javasoljuk, hogy finomhangoljuk ezeket a modelleket a tanulás erősítésével és egy hatékony jutalmazási funkcióval, amely kifejezetten rögzíti a válasz és a személyi tények közötti következetességet, valamint a szemantikai valószínűséget. A PersonaChat korpuszon végzett automatikus és emberi értékeléseink megerősítik, hogy megközelítésünk növeli a személyi tényekkel ténylegesen összhangban álló válaszok arányát a felügyelt partnerével szemben, miközben megőrzi a válaszok nyelvi minőségét.', 'el': 'Νευρικά μοντέλα για τη δημιουργία απόκρισης παράγουν απαντήσεις που είναι σημασιολογικά αληθοφανείς αλλά όχι απαραίτητα συνεπείς με γεγονότα που περιγράφουν την προσωπικότητα του ομιλητή. Αυτά τα μοντέλα εκπαιδεύονται με πλήρως εποπτευμένη μάθηση όπου η αντικειμενική λειτουργία ελάχιστα αποτυπώνει την πραγματική συνέπεια. Προτείνουμε να τελειοποιήσουμε αυτά τα μοντέλα ενισχύοντας τη μάθηση και μια αποτελεσματική λειτουργία ανταμοιβής που αποτυπώνει ρητά τη συνέπεια μεταξύ μιας απόκρισης και δεδομένων προσωπικότητας καθώς και τη σημασιολογική αξιοπιστία. Οι αυτόματες και ανθρώπινες αξιολογήσεις μας στο σώμα επιβεβαιώνουν ότι η προσέγγισή μας αυξάνει το ποσοστό απαντήσεων που είναι πραγματικά συνεπείς με δεδομένα προσωπικού έναντι του εποπτευόμενου ομόλογού του, διατηρώντας παράλληλα την γλωσσική ποιότητα των απαντήσεων.', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური მოდელები რექსპერაციის შემდეგ გამოყენება, რომლებიც სემონტიკურად შესაძლებელია, მაგრამ არ უნდა ფაქტიკურად შესაძლებელია ფაქტიკებით, რომლებიც აღწერებენ ეს მოდელები უფრო დანარწმუნებული სწავლებით, სადაც ობიექტიური ფუნქცია უბრალოდ ფაქტიური კონსტენსტურობას დააკვირდება. ჩვენ გვეძლევა ამ მოდელების სწავლებით სწავლებით და ეფექტიური სამუშაო ფუნქციას, რომელიც განსხვავებულად განსხვავებს პასუხის და პერსონატური ფაქტის შორის შემდეგ, და სემენტიური და ჩვენი ავტომატიკური და ადამიანის განსაზღვრება პროცენაChat კორპუსში დააწყვეტილება, რომ ჩვენი პროგრამის განსაზღვრების სიმაღლე, რომელიც ფაქტიურად პროცენტური ფაქტისთვის შემდეგ მისი დანარწმუნებული კომპორ', 'it': "I modelli neurali per la generazione di risposte producono risposte semanticamente plausibili ma non necessariamente coerenti con fatti che descrivono la persona del relatore. Questi modelli sono formati con apprendimento completamente supervisionato dove la funzione oggettiva cattura appena coerenza fattuale. Proponiamo di mettere a punto questi modelli rafforzando l'apprendimento e una funzione di ricompensa efficiente che cattura esplicitamente la coerenza tra una risposta e fatti personali, nonché la plausibilità semantica. Le nostre valutazioni automatiche e umane sul corpus di PersonaChat confermano che il nostro approccio aumenta il tasso di risposte che sono effettivamente coerenti con i fatti personali rispetto alla sua controparte supervisionata, pur mantenendo la qualità linguistica delle risposte.", 'lt': 'Neuraliniai atsako generavimo modeliai sukuria atsakus, kurie yra semantiškai patikimi, bet nebūtinai faktiškai suderinami su faktais, apibūdinančiais kalbėjo asmenybę. Šie modeliai mokomi visapusiškai prižiūrint mokymąsi, kai objektyvioji funkcija vargu ar apima faktinį nuoseklumą. Siūlome patobulinti šiuos modelius stiprinant mokymąsi ir veiksmingą atlyginimo funkciją, kuri aiškiai parodytų atsako ir asmeninio pobūdžio faktų bei semantinio patikimumo nuoseklumą. Our automatic and human evaluations on the PersonaChat corpus confirm that our approach increases the rate of responses that are factually consistent with persona facts over its supervised counterpart while retains the language quality of responses.', 'kk': 'Жауап жасау үшін невралдық моделдері семантикалық жауап береді, бірақ шындықтан сөйлейтінің қызметінің сипаттамасын түсіндіретін факттерге сәйкес келмейді. Бұл үлгілер мақсатты функциясының фактикалық тұрақтылығын қалай оқыту үшін толық бақылады. Біз бұл үлгілерді оқытуды жақсарту және эффективті үлгілер функциясы арқылы жауап беру және белгілі факттер арасындағы тәуелсіздік және семантикалық оқыту мүмкіндігін түсіндіру үші PersonaChat корпусындағы автоматты және адамдардың оқиғаларымыз қасиеттеріміздің қасиеттерінің қасиетті қалдырып тұрғанда, тілдердің сапатын сақтап тұрғанда, қасиеттеріміздің қасиеттеріміздің қасиеттерімен қатысты дегенді', 'mk': 'Неуралните модели за генерација на одговор произведуваат одговори кои се семантично веројатни, но не неопходно фактично координати со фактите кои ја опишуваат личноста на говорникот. Овие модели се обучени со целосно надгледувано учење каде објективната функција едвај ја прифаќа фактичната констанција. Ние предлагаме да ги пофинираме овие модели со зајакнување на учењето и ефикасна функција на награда која експлицитно ја прифаќа констанцијата помеѓу одговорот и личните факти како и семантичната веројатност. Нашите автоматски и човечки проценки на Корпусот PersonaChat потврдуваат дека нашиот пристап ја зголемува стапката на одговори кои се фактично во согласност со лични факти во врска со неговиот надгледуван колега, додека го задржува јазичниот квалитет на одговорите.', 'ms': "Neural models for response generation produce responses that are semantically plausible but not necessarily factually consistent with facts describing the speaker's persona.  Model ini dilatih dengan pembelajaran yang diawasi sepenuhnya di mana fungsi objektif hampir tidak menangkap konsistensi fakta. Kami cadangkan untuk menyesuaikan model ini dengan pembelajaran kuasa dan fungsi hadiah yang efisien yang secara jelas menangkap konsistensi antara balas jawapan dan fakta persoalan serta kepercayaan semantik. Evaluasi automatik dan manusia kita pada Korpus PersonaChat mengesahkan bahawa pendekatan kita meningkatkan kadar balas yang secara fakta konsisten dengan fakta-fakta personali atas kontrak yang diawasi sementara menyimpan kualiti bahasa balas.", 'ml': 'പ്രതികരിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രവർത്തിക്കുള്ള നെയുറല്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അത് സംസാരിക്കുന്ന വ്യക്തിയെ വിശദീകരിക് ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന പഠനത്തില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. സാധാരണ ഫങ് പഠനത്തിന്റെയും പ്രതിഫലത്തിന്റെയും വ്യക്തമായ പ്രതിഫലത്തിന്റെയും പ്രതികരണത്തിന്റെയും മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള സ്ഥിതിയെയും പിടിച്ചുകൊട വ്യക്തിപരമായ ചാറ്റ് കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ആത്മികവും മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d ഉറപ്പ് വരുത്തുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രായോഗ്യം ശരിക്കും പ്രതികരണങ്ങളുടെ വിധി കൂ', 'mt': "Neural models for response generation produce responses that are semantically plausible but not necessarily factually consistent with facts describing the speaker's persona.  Dawn il-mudelli huma mħarrġa b’tagħlim sorveljat bis-sħiħ fejn il-funzjoni oġġettiva bilkemm taqbad il-konsistenza fattwali. Aħna qed nipproponu li dawn il-mudelli jiġu rfinuti permezz tat-tagħlim rinfurzat u funzjoni effiċjenti ta' premju li taqbad b'mod espliċitu l-konsistenza bejn reazzjoni u fatti personali kif ukoll plawżibbiltà semantika. L-evalwazzjonijiet awtomatiċi u umani tagħna dwar il-PersonaChat corpus jikkonfermaw li l-approċċ tagħna jżid ir-rata ta’ reazzjonijiet li huma fattwalment konsistenti ma’ fatti personali fuq il-kontroparti superviża tiegħu filwaqt li jżomm il-kwalità lingwistika tar-reazzjonijiet.", 'no': 'Neurale modeller for å generera svar produserer svarar som er semantisk uttrykkbare, men ikkje nødvendig faktisk konsisterer med faktar som skildrar personen til taleren. Desse modelane er trengte med fullstendig oversikt av læring der målsettingsfunksjonen berre hentar faktisk konsistens. Vi foreslår å finne opp desse modelane ved å styrke læring og ein effektiv rekningsfunksjon som uttrykker konsistens mellom ein svar og personfaktor og semantisk uttrykk. Våre automatiske og menneske evalueringar på PersonaChat-korpusen bekrefter at tilnærminga vårt øker rate av svar som faktisk er konsistent med personfaktar over sine oversikte counterpart mens det beholder språkkvaliteten av svar.', 'pl': 'Modele neuronowe generowania odpowiedzi produkują odpowiedzi, które są semantycznie wiarygodne, ale niekoniecznie faktycznie zgodne z faktami opisującymi osobowość mówcy. Modele te są szkolone w pełni nadzorowane uczenie się, gdzie funkcja obiektywna ledwo uchwyca faktyczną spójność. Proponujemy dostosowanie tych modeli poprzez wzmocnienie uczenia się i efektywną funkcję nagród, która wyraźnie uwzględnia spójność pomiędzy odpowiedzią a faktami persona oraz wiarygodność semantyczną. Nasze automatyczne i ludzkie oceny korpusu PersonaChat potwierdzają, że nasze podejście zwiększa szybkość odpowiedzi, które są faktycznie zgodne z faktami persona w stosunku do jego nadzorowanego odpowiednika, przy jednoczesnym zachowaniu jakości językowej odpowiedzi.', 'mn': 'Үүний хариу үйлдвэрлэлийн мэдрэлийн загварууд үр дүнтэй хариу үйлдвэрлэх боломжтой. Гэхдээ илтгэгчийн хувьцааныг тайлбарлаж буй үнэндээ хариу үйлдвэрлэхгүй. Эдгээр загварууд бүрэн удирдлагатай суралцаж суралцаж, зорилготой функц нь үнэндээ байдлыг ойлгохгүй байдаг. Бид эдгээр загваруудыг суралцах болон үр дүнтэй шагналын функцийг тодорхой хариулт, хариулт, хүний үнэний хоорондох байдлыг, мөн semantic итгэл үнэний хоорондох байдлыг тодорхой ойлгохыг санал болгож байна. PersonaChat корпус-ын автоматик болон хүн төрөлхтний оюутнууд бидний ойлголт хариултын хувьд үнэндээ хариултын хувьд хүн төрөлхтний хариултын хувьд байдаг гэдгийг баталдаг.', 'ro': 'Modelele neurale pentru generarea de răspunsuri produc răspunsuri care sunt semantic plauzibile, dar nu neapărat coerente fapt cu faptele care descriu persoana vorbitorului. Aceste modele sunt instruite cu învățare complet supravegheată în cazul în care funcția obiectivă abia captează consecvența faptelor. Propunem să reglăm aceste modele prin consolidarea învățării și o funcție eficientă de recompensă care surprinde în mod explicit coerența dintre un răspuns și faptele personale, precum și plauzibilitatea semantică. Evaluările noastre automate și umane pe corpul PersonaChat confirmă faptul că abordarea noastră crește rata răspunsurilor care sunt în concordanță cu faptele personale față de omologul său supravegheat, păstrând în același timp calitatea limbajului răspunsurilor.', 'sr': 'Neuralni modeli za generaciju reakcija proizvode odgovore koje su semantički uvjerljive ali ne nužno u skladu sa činjenicama koja opisuju osobu govornika. Ovi modeli su obučeni sa potpuno nadziranom učenjem gde objektivna funkcija jedva hvata činjeničnu konsistenciju. Predlažemo da sredimo te modele podrškom učenja pojačanja i učinkovitom funkcijom nagrade koja pojasno uhvati konsekvenciju između odgovora i ličnih činjenica, kao i semantičke uvjerljivosti. Naše automatske i ljudske procjene o korpusu PersonaChat potvrđuju da naš pristup povećava stopu odgovora koje su činjenice u skladu sa osobnim činjenicama nad nadzornim kolegom dok drži jezičku kvalitet odgovora.', 'so': 'Tusaalada diidiga ah ee qaranka jawaabta ayaa soo saara jawaabo, taas oo si qasab ah u leedahay qofka hadalka ku hadla. Tusaaladan waxaa lagu bartaa waxbarasho aad u ilaalisan, meesha ay ku shaqeeyo waxyaabaha la jeedo ay si yar u qabsadaan. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa in tusaalahan si fiican u hagaajinno horumarinta waxbarashada iyo shaqada mushahaarada oo si cad u qabsada sameynta jawaabta iyo waxyaabaha shakhsiga ah iyo tababarka kala duwan. Qiimeyntayada bilowga ah iyo dadka oo ku saabsan shirkadda shakhsiga ah waxay xaqiijiyaan in dhaqdhaqaalahayagu kordhiyo qiimaha jawaabaha oo si dhab ah ugu waafaqsan arrimaha qofka la ilaaliyey marka uu haysto qiimaha jawaabaha afka.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වි මේ මොඩේල්ස් පුළුවන් පරික්ෂා කරලා ඉගෙනගන්න පුළුවන් ඉගෙනගන්න කියලා. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා මේ මෝඩේල්ස් එක්ක සාධාරණයක් ඉගෙනගන්න සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ සාමාන්තික විශ්නයක් අතර ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක අපේ ස්වායංක්\u200dරියාත්මක සහ මිනිස්සු විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාස කරනවා අපේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා අපේ ප්\u200d', 'sv': 'Neurala modeller för responsgenerering ger svar som är semantiskt rimliga men inte nödvändigtvis i sakfrågan överensstämmer med fakta som beskriver talarens personlighet. Dessa modeller är utbildade med fullt övervakat lärande där den objektiva funktionen knappt fångar saklig konsekvens. Vi föreslår att finslipa dessa modeller genom att förstärka inlärningen och en effektiv belöningsfunktion som uttryckligen fångar konsekvensen mellan ett svar och personfakta samt semantisk sannolikhet. Våra automatiska och mänskliga utvärderingar av PersonaChat-korpusen bekräftar att vårt tillvägagångssätt ökar svarsfrekvensen som faktiskt överensstämmer med personfakta jämfört med dess övervakade motsvarighet samtidigt som språkkvaliteten behålls.', 'ta': 'பதில் உருவாக்குவதற்கான நெருக்கமான மாதிரிகள் பதில்களை உருவாக்குகிறது ஆனால் பேச்சாளரின் நபரை விவரிப்பது உண்மையில்லை. இந்த மாதிரிகள் முழுமையாக கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட கற்றுக்கொண்டு பயிற்சிக்கப்படுகிறது இலக்கு செயல்பாடு உண்மையி நாம் இந்த மாதிரிகளை நன்றாக துண்டிக்க நினைவூட்டுகிறோம் கல்வி மற்றும் ஒரு வேலை கூலி செயல்பாடு அது வெளிப்படையாக ஒரு பதில் மற்றும் தனிப்பட்ட காரண எங்கள் தனிப்பட்ட அரட்டை குறிப்புகள் மீது மனித மதிப்புகளை உறுதிப்படுத்துகிறது எங்கள் அணுக்கம் உண்மையில் அதிகரிக்கும் விளைவுகள் உண்மையில் அது தனிப்பட்ட கா', 'ur': 'جواب کی نسل کے لئے نیورال موڈل جواب دیتے ہیں جو سیمانٹی طور پر قابل یقین ہیں لیکن اصل یہ ہے کہ اسپینٹر کے شخص کی توصیف کرنے والی حقیقت کے ساتھ موجود نہیں ہیں. یہ موڈل پورے نظارت کے ساتھ تعلیم کی جاتی ہیں جہاں موجود فعالیت کم حقیقی موجودگی کو پکڑتی ہے. ہم ان مدلوں کو مضبوط تعلیم کرنے کے ذریعہ مضبوط اور عمدہ ثواب کے فعالیت کے ذریعہ مضبوط تعلیم کرنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو ایک جواب اور شخصی حقیقت کے درمیان موجودگی کو مضبوط پکڑتا ہے اور ایک سیمانتی مضبوطی کے ذریعہ۔ ہمارے شخصaChat کورپوس کے بارے میں ہماری آٹوٹی اور انسان کی ارزش کی تصدیق کرتی ہے کہ ہماری تقریبا جواب کے درجے میں بڑھتا ہے جو شخصی حقیقت کے ساتھ اس کی نظر رکھی ہوئی کنٹوری پر موجود ہیں اور زبان کی کیفیت کو روک رہی ہے۔', 'vi': 'Các mô hình thần kinh cho thế hệ phản ứng tạo ra các phản ứng có thể thực hiện theo ngữ pháp nhưng không nhất thiết phù hợp với các s ự kiện mô tả nhân cách của loa. Những mẫu này được đào tạo với việc học tập được giám sát đầy đủ nơi chức năng mục tiêu không nắm rõ sự tương đồng. Chúng tôi đề xuất chỉnh những mô hình này bằng cách củng cố học tập và một hàm thưởng hiệu quả rõ ràng nắm bắt sự đồng nhất giữa sự trả lời và sự thật cá nhân cũng như hợp lý ngữ pháp. Những đánh giá tự động và con người của chúng tôi trên tập đoàn PersonaChat Corpus khẳng định rằng phương pháp của chúng tôi tăng tốc độ trả lời, hoàn toàn phù hợp với sự kiện cá nhân trên đối tượng giám sát của nó, trong khi giữ chất lượng ngôn ngữ của các đáp ứng.', 'uz': "Javob yaratish uchun neyrolik modellari esa semantik playin bo'ladigan javoblar yaratadi, ammo gapiruvchi shaxsiyatni tahrirlash haqida bir narsa emas. Ushbu modellarni butunlay o'rganish bilan o'rganishga o'rganadi. Biz bu modellarni o'rganish va muvaffaqiyatli amalga oshirish imkoniyatini bajarishimizni tahlil qilamiz. Bu javob va shaxsiy faktlar va semantik plausiyatlari orasidagi davomida davomida muvaffaqiyatlarni ko'rsatadi. Shaxsiy Chat Korpusida bizning avtomatik va inson qiymatlarimiz qo'llanmiz tilning javoblar sifatida o'xshash bo'lgan javoblarning chegarasini ko'rsatadi va biz tashkilotlarini tasavvur qiladigan shaxsiy haqiqatlarni ishlab chiqaradi.", 'bg': 'Невровите модели за генериране на отговор произвеждат отговори, които са семантично правдоподобни, но не непременно фактически съвместими с фактите, описващи личността на говорителя. Тези модели са обучени с напълно контролирано обучение, където обективната функция едва улавя фактическата последователност. Предлагаме тези модели да бъдат фино настроени чрез засилване на обучението и ефективна функция за възнаграждение, която изрично улавя съгласуваността между отговор и личностни факти, както и семантична правдоподобност. Нашите автоматични и човешки оценки на корпуса потвърждават, че подходът ни увеличава процента на отговори, които са фактически съвместими с фактите на личността, спрямо неговия надзорен партньор, като същевременно запазва езиковото качество на отговорите.', 'hr': 'Neuralni modeli za generaciju odgovora proizvode odgovore koje su semantički uvjerljive ali ne nužno u skladu s činjenicama opisujući osobu govornika. Ovi modeli su obučeni sa potpuno nadziranom učenjem gdje objektivna funkcija jedva uhvati činjeničnu konsistenciju. Predlažemo da ispravljamo te modele učenjem pojačavanja i učinkovitom funkcijom nagrade koja pojasno uhvati konsekvenciju između odgovora i osobnih činjenica, kao i semantičke uvjerljivosti. Naše automatske i ljudske procjene o korpusu PersonaChat potvrđuju da naš pristup povećava stopu odgovora koje su činjenice u skladu s osobnim činjenicama nad nadzornim kolegom dok drži jezičku kvalitet odgovora.', 'nl': 'Neurale modellen voor responsgeneratie produceren reacties die semantisch plausibel zijn, maar niet noodzakelijkerwijs feitelijk consistent zijn met feiten die de persoonlijkheid van de spreker beschrijven. Deze modellen worden getraind met volledig begeleid leren waarbij de objectieve functie nauwelijks feitelijke consistentie vangt. We stellen voor om deze modellen te verfijnen door middel van versterking learning en een efficiënte beloningsfunctie die expliciet de consistentie tussen een respons en persona feiten en semantische plausibiliteit vastlegt. Onze automatische en menselijke evaluaties op het PersonaChat corpus bevestigen dat onze aanpak de snelheid van reacties verhoogt die feitelijk consistent zijn met persona feiten ten opzichte van de begeleide tegenhanger, terwijl de taalkwaliteit van reacties behouden blijft.', 'da': 'Neurale modeller til responsgenerering giver svar, der er semantisk plausible, men ikke nødvendigvis faktisk i overensstemmelse med fakta, der beskriver talerens personlighed. Disse modeller trænes med fuldt overvåget læring, hvor den objektive funktion knap opfanger faktisk konsistens. Vi foreslår at finjustere disse modeller ved at styrke læring og en effektiv belønningsfunktion, der eksplicit fanger konsistensen mellem et svar og personfakta samt semantisk sandsynlighed. Vores automatiske og menneskelige evalueringer af PersonaChat-korpuset bekræfter, at vores tilgang øger antallet af svar, der faktisk er i overensstemmelse med personfakta i forhold til den overvågede modpart, samtidig med at den bevarer sprogkvaliteten af svar.', 'de': 'Neuronale Modelle zur Antwortgenerierung erzeugen Antworten, die semantisch plausibel sind, aber nicht unbedingt sachlich konsistent mit Fakten sind, die die Persönlichkeit des Sprechers beschreiben. Diese Modelle werden mit vollständig überwachtem Lernen trainiert, wobei die objektive Funktion kaum die tatsächliche Konsistenz erfasst. Wir schlagen vor, diese Modelle durch Verstärkungslernen und eine effiziente Belohnungsfunktion zu verfeinern, die explizit die Konsistenz zwischen Response und Persona-Fakten sowie semantische Plausibilität erfasst. Unsere automatischen und menschlichen Auswertungen im PersonaChat-Korpus bestätigen, dass unser Ansatz die Rate der Antworten erhöht, die faktisch mit Persona-Fakten konsistent sind gegenüber dem überwachten Gegenstück, während die Sprachqualität der Antworten beibehalten wird.', 'id': 'Model saraf untuk generasi respon menghasilkan respon yang secara semantis plausible tapi tidak perlu secara fakta konsisten dengan fakta yang menjelaskan persoalan pembicara. Model ini dilatih dengan belajar yang diawasi sepenuhnya dimana fungsi objektif hampir tidak menangkap konsistensi fakta. Kami mengusulkan untuk memperbaiki model ini dengan memperkuat belajar dan fungsi hadiah efisien yang secara eksplisit menangkap konsistensi antara respon dan fakta pribadi serta plausibilitas semantis. Evaluasi otomatis dan manusia kita pada PersonaChat corpus mengkonfirmasi bahwa pendekatan kita meningkatkan tingkat respon yang secara fakta konsisten dengan fakta-fakta personalitas atas rekan yang diawasi sementara menjaga kualitas bahasa respon.', 'ko': '반응이 생성된 신경모델이 발생하는 반응은 의미적으로는 합리적이지만 반드시 말하는 사람의 역할을 묘사하는 사실과 일치하는 것은 아니다.이 모델들은 완전한 감독 학습을 통해 훈련을 하는데 그 중에서 목표 함수는 사실의 일치성을 거의 포착하지 못한다.우리는 학습을 강화하고 효과적인 장려 함수를 강화함으로써 이러한 모델을 미세하게 조정할 것을 제안한다. 이 함수는 응답과 인물 역할 사실 간의 일치성과 의미의 합리성을 명확하게 포착할 수 있다.PersonaChat 자료 라이브러리에 대한 자동 및 인공 평가는 우리의 방법이 응답의 언어 질을 유지하는 동시에 Persona 사실과 일치하는 응답률을 높였다는 것을 증명했다.', 'sw': 'Mradi wa msingi wa kizazi cha majibu unazalisha majibu ambazo vinaweza kucheza kwa kiasi kikubwa lakini si lazima kina sawa na ukweli unaoelezea mtu wa mzungumzaji. Mifano hii inafundishwa kwa kujifunza kwa ujumla ambapo kazi ya malengo hayajafanikisha ukweli. Tunazipendekeza kuunganisha mifano haya kwa kuimarisha elimu na kazi yenye ufanisi wa malipo ambayo inaonyesha msisitizo kati ya majibu na ukweli wa watu pamoja na uvumilivu wa kimapenzi. Tathmini zetu za kibinafsi na binadamu kwenye makampuni ya Mazungumzo binafsi zinathibitisha kwamba hatua yetu inaongezea kiwango cha miitikio ambacho kwa kweli kina ukweli na ukweli wa watu juu ya utangalizi wake wakati hubakia kiwango cha majibu ya lugha.', 'af': "Neurale modele vir antwoord generasie produseer antwoordes wat semantiese veroorsaaklik is, maar nie noodsaaklik gevolg bestaan met fakte wat die sprekker se persoon beskryf. Hierdie modele is opgelei met volledige ondersoekte leer waar die objekte funksie skaars faktuele konsistensie opneem. Ons voorstel om hierdie modele te fin-tuneer deur versterking leer en 'n effektief vergelde funksie wat die konsistensie tussen 'n antwoord en persoonlike fakte en semantiese vergelykbaarheid opneem. Ons outomatiese en menslike evaluasies op die PersonaChat corpus bevestig dat ons toegang die rate van antwoordes wat faktisk gelyk is met persoonlike fakties oor sy ondersoekte gemeenskap terwyl die taal kwaliteit van antwoordes hou.", 'sq': 'Modelet neuronale për gjenerimin e përgjigjes prodhojnë përgjigje që janë semantikisht të besueshme por jo domosdoshmërisht të konsistente me faktet që përshkruajnë personalitetin e folësit. Këto modele janë trajnuar me mësim të mbikqyrur plotësisht ku funksioni objektiv mezi kapë konsistencën faktike. Ne propozojmë që këto modele të përmirësohen duke përforcuar mësimin dhe një funksion shpërblimi të efektshëm që përfshin shprehësisht konsistencën midis një reagimi dhe fakteve personale si dhe besueshmërisë semantike. Vlerësimet tona automatike dhe njerëzore në Korpus PersonaChat konfirmojnë se qasja jonë rrit normën e përgjigjeve që janë në fakt konsistente me faktet personale mbi homologun e tij të mbikqyrur ndërsa mban cilësinë gjuhësore të përgjigjeve.', 'fa': 'مدل عصبی برای نسل پاسخ جواب جواب می\u200cدهد که به صورت semantic قابل اعتماد هستند ولی لازم نیست که در واقع با حقیقت\u200cهایی که توصیف شخصیت صحبت کننده است. این مدلها با یادگیری کاملاً تحت نظر گرفته شده آموزش داده می شوند که عملکرد هدف به سختی هماهنگی حقیقی را گرفته است. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم این مدلها را با یادگیری افزایش و تاثیر پاداش موثری که به طور واضح هماهنگی بین یک پاسخ و حقیقت شخصی و همچنین قابلیت semantic را دریافت کنیم. ارزیابی\u200cهای خودکار و انسانی ما در مورد شرکت PersonaChat تایید می\u200cکند که دستور ما سرعت جواب\u200cهای شخصی را افزایش می\u200cدهد که در واقع با حقیقت شخصی در مورد همکاری که در نظر می\u200cگیرد در حالی که کیفیت زبان جواب\u200cها را نگه می\u200cدارد.', 'tr': 'Cevap jeneraly üçin näral modeller semantik ýagdaýda ynamly jogaplar döreýär, ýöne aslynda gepleşiginiň kişiniň tassyklandyrýan zatlary bilen meňzeýär. Bu nusgalar, maksadyň funksiýasynyň asla bir nusgasyny çekip bilmeýän öwrenmesi bilen doly gözleýän öwrenmesi bilen bilinýär. Biz bu nusgalary güçlendirmegi we täsirli täsirli täsirli täsirler üçin düzeltmegi teklip berýäris. Bu nusgalaryň bir jogabat we kişisel faktlaryň we semantik ynamlylyklaryň arasynda durmuşyny a şdyrmagyny düşünýäris. Biziň PersonaChat korpusyndaky awtomatik we adamlarymyz çözümleşmelerimiz, özümiziň ýaryşymyz çykyşlaryň ýüzüne görnüşli tersleşiginiň üstünde şahsy faktlaryň bardygyny tassyklaýar we çykyşlaryň howpsuzlygyny sagda tutýarlar.', 'am': 'የውጤት ትውልድ አካባቢ ምሳሌዎች የንግግር አካባቢ የሚጠይቁትን ነገር ግን በአስቸጋሪው የራሳቸውን በሚያሳየው ውሸት አይተካከሉም፡፡ እነዚህም ሞዴላዎች እውነተኛውን ማግኘት በሙሉ ተማርተዋል፡፡ እነዚህን ምሳሌዎች በማድረግ እና በዋጋ ማድረግ እና በጥሩ የዋጋ ክፍል በማድረግ እና በአሳማሚ እና በአካባቢው ውሳኔዎችን እና የስህተት ስህተት እና የስህተት ግንኙነትን በግልጽ ለመያሰብ እና በአካባቢ ስልጣንን ለመግለጽ እና ለመጠቀም እናስባለን። የግል አካባቢው ኮርፓስ ላይ የገዛ ራሳዊ እና የሰው ማስታወቂያችን የቋንቋውን ጥያቄ በመጠበቅ በተቃዋሚው የራሳቸውን ፍጥረት ያበዛል፡፡', 'bn': 'প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রজন্মের নিউরেল মডেল প্রতিক্রিয়া তৈরি করে যা সামান্যিক ভাবে প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রকাশ করে কিন্তু প্রয়োজনীয় ব্যক্তিকে বর এই মডেলগুলো পুরোপুরি পর্যবেক্ষণ করা শিক্ষা দিয়ে প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে যেখানে উদ্দেশ্যের ফাংশন আসলের সাথে স শিক্ষা আর কার্যকর পুরস্কার বৃদ্ধি প্রদান করার মাধ্যমে আমরা এই মডেলগুলোকে সুন্দর করার প্রস্তাব দিচ্ছি যা স্পষ্ট প্রতিক্রিয়া এবং ব্যক্তি সত্যের মধ্য ব্যক্তিগত চ্যাট কর্পাসের উপর আমাদের স্বয়ংক্রিয় এবং মানুষের মূল্য নিশ্চিত করেছে যে আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়ার হার বাড়িয়ে দেয় যা সত্যিকারে প্রতিক্রিয়া ব্যক্', 'hy': 'Հարձագանքի սերունդի նյարդային մոդելները արտադրում են արձագանքներ, որոնք սեմանտիկապես հավատալի են, բայց պարտադիր չէ, որ իրականում համապատասխանում են խոսացողի անհատականությունը նկարագրող փաստերի հետ: These models are trained with fully supervised learning where the objective function barely captures factual consistency.  Մենք առաջարկում ենք բարելավել այս մոդելները, ուժեղացնելով ուսումնասիրությունը և արդյունավետ վարձի գործառույթը, որը բացահայտորեն ներառում է պատասխանի և անձնական փաստերի միջև և սեմանտիկ հավատարմությունը: Մեր ավտոմատիկ և մարդկային գնահատումները անձնական Chat կորպուսի մասին հաստատում են, որ մեր մոտեցումը բարձրացնում է արձագանքների արագությունը, որը փաստացիորեն համապատասխանում է անձնական փաստերի հետ իր վերահսկված համեմատակի վրա, մինչդեռ պահպանում է արձագա', 'az': 'Cevap n…ôsill…ôrinin n√∂ral modell…ôri semantik olaraq inanńĪlmaz, amma …ôslind…ô danńĪŇüanlarńĪn kiŇüisini t…ôsdiql…ôy…ôn h…ôqiq…ôtl…ôr…ô uyńüun deyill…ôr. Bu modell…ôr tamamil…ô g√∂zl…ôyir √∂yr…ônm…ôsi il…ô t…ôhsil edilir ki, objektif fonksiyonun …ôslind…ô …ôslind…ô …ôslind…ô t…ôhsil edilm…ôsini alńĪr. Biz bu modell…ôri t…ôdricl…ôyici √∂yr…ônm…ôk v…ô m√ľkafat funksiyasńĪ il…ô d√ľz…ôltm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn t…ôklif edirik ki, cavab ver…ôn v…ô kiŇüilik faktlarńĪn v…ô semantik m√∂vzularńĪn arasńĪndakńĪ m√ľ…ôyy…ônl…ôŇüdirilir. PersonaChat korpusu haqqńĪndakńĪ avtomatik v…ô insan deńüerlendirm…ôl…ôrimiz t…ôrzimizin reaksiyonlarńĪn d…ôr…ôsini artńĪrmańüńĪnńĪ t…ôsdiql…ôyir v…ô dill…ôrin cavab qism…ôtini saxlayaraq, h…ôqiq…ôt…ôn d…ô kiŇüilik faktlarńĪna uyńüun-suallarńĪnńĪ artńĪrmańüńĪnńĪ t…ôsdiql…ôyir.', 'bs': 'Neuralni modeli za generaciju odgovora proizvode odgovore koje su semantički uvjerljive ali ne nužno u skladu sa činjenicama koja opisuju osobu govornika. Ovi modeli su obučeni sa potpuno nadziranom učenjem gdje objektivna funkcija jedva hvata činjeničnu konsekvenciju. Predlažemo da sredimo te modele podrškom učenja pojačanja i učinkovitom funkcijom nagrade koja objašnjava konsekvenciju između odgovora i ličnih činjenica, kao i semantičke uvjerljivosti. Naše automatske i ljudske procjene o korpusu PersonaChat potvrđuju da naš pristup povećava stopu odgovora koje su činjenice u skladu sa osobnim činjenicama nad nadzornim kolegom dok drži jezičku kvalitet odgovora.', 'ca': "Els models neuronals de generació de respostes produeixen respostes semànticament plausible s però no necessariament compatibles amb els fets que descriuen la persona del parlant. These models are trained with fully supervised learning where the objective function barely captures factual consistency.  Proposem ajustar aquests models reforçant l'aprenentatge i una funció eficient de recompensa que capture explícitament la consistencia entre la resposta i els fets personals, així com la plausibilitat semàntica. Les nostres evaluacions automàtiques i humanes sobre el corps PersonaChat confirmen que el nostre enfocament augmenta el ritme de respostes que són de fet coherents amb els fets personals sobre la seva homologue supervisada mentre conserva la qualitat lingüística de les respostes.", 'et': 'Reaktsiooni genereerimiseks mõeldud neuromudelid annavad vastuseid, mis on semantiliselt usutavad, kuid mitte tingimata faktiliselt kooskõlas kõneleja isikut kirjeldavate faktidega. Need mudelid on koolitatud täielikult järelevalvega õppimisega, kus objektiivne funktsioon vaevalt kajastab faktilist järjepidevust. Me teeme ettepaneku neid mudeleid täpsustada tugevdades õppimist ja tõhusat preemiafunktsiooni, mis selgesõnaliselt kajastab reaktsiooni ja isiklike faktide vahelist sidusust ning semantilist usutavust. Meie automaatsed ja inimlikud hinnangud PersonaChat korpusele kinnitavad, et meie lähenemisviis suurendab isiklike faktidega faktiliselt kooskõlas olevate vastuste määra võrreldes järelevalve all olevate vastaspooltega, säilitades samas vastuste keelekvaliteedi.', 'cs': 'Neurální modely pro generování odpovědí produkují odpovědi, které jsou sémanticky věrohodné, ale nemusí nutně fakticky v souladu s fakty popisujícími osobnost řečníka. Tyto modely jsou trénovány s plně kontrolovaným učením, kde objektivní funkce sotva zachycuje faktickou konzistenci. Navrhujeme jemné ladění těchto modelů posílením učení a efektivní funkcí odměny, která explicitně zachycuje konzistenci mezi odpovědí a persona fakty, stejně jako sémantickou věrohodnost. Naše automatické a lidské hodnocení v korpusu PersonaChat potvrzují, že náš přístup zvyšuje míru odpovědí, které jsou skutečně v souladu s osobními fakty oproti kontrolovanému protějšku a zachovává si jazykovou kvalitu odpovědí.', 'fi': 'Neuromallit vasteen tuottamiseen tuottavat vastauksia, jotka ovat semanttisesti uskottavia, mutta eivät välttämättä tosiasiallisesti yhdenmukaisia puhujan persoonaa kuvaavien faktojen kanssa. Nämä mallit on koulutettu täysin valvotulla oppimisella, jossa objektiivinen toiminto tuskin vangitsee tosiasiallista johdonmukaisuutta. Ehdotamme näiden mallien hienosäätämistä vahvistamalla oppimista ja tehokkaalla palkitsemistoiminnolla, joka havainnollistaa vasteen ja persoonan välisen johdonmukaisuuden sekä semanttisen uskottavuuden. Automaattiset ja inhimilliset arviomme PersonaChat-korpusesta vahvistavat, että lähestymistapamme lisää henkilökohtaisten faktojen kanssa todellisuudessa johdonmukaisten vastausten määrää valvottuun vastineeseen verrattuna säilyttäen samalla vastausten kielen laadun.', 'jv': 'model penting Laptop" and "Desktop Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem iki dadi nggawe layakno lan ijol-ijolan winih sing luwih apik dhéwé kuwi kesempatan kanggo nguasai perusahaan karo pawaran karo perusahaan lan ora oleh dumadhi sing bakal dumadhi. Awak dhéwé éntuk perbudhakan karo hal-hal karo perbudhakan PersonaTalk kuwi nggawe barang nggawe geraksé awak dhéwé kuwi tindakan sing nguasai perbudhakan karo perbudhakan karo perbudhakan karo perbudhakan kuwi wis nguasai mèh dumadhi kapan langkung ora bisa langgar kuwi responsmaran.', 'he': 'דוגמנים נוירוניים לדור התגובה יוצרים תגובות שאפשרות לסמנטית אבל לא בהכרח תואמות למעשה לעובדות שמתארים את אישתו של הרמקול. דוגמנים אלה מאומנים עם לימוד מושלם במלוא שבו הפונקציה האובייקטיבית בקושי תואמת עובדה. אנו מציעים לעצבן את הדוגמנים האלה על ידי לימוד חיבורי ופונקציית פרס יעילה שמתפסת באופן ברור את התקבילות בין תגובה לעובדות אישיות כמו גם אמינות סמנטית. הערכות האוטומטיות והאנושיות שלנו על קורפוס PersonaChat מאשרות שהגישה שלנו מגבילה את קצב התגובות שמתאים למעשה לעובדות אישיות מעל השותף המפוקח שלה בזמן שמחזיק את איכות השפה של התגובות.', 'ha': "Modellun neural wa kizalin ajiya zasu sami mai jibar da maras da za'a yi musamman da shi kuma bã ya lazima da gaskiyar da gaskiyar ta bayyana ma'anar mai magana. An sanar da waɗannan misalin a cikakken da aka tsare su a wurin da aikin objective bã zai iya riƙon da gaske ba. Kayyar da musammani masu amfani da ƙara learning da wani aikin ijãra mai kyau wanda ke sami mutane da gaskiyar gaskiyar da kuma misalin na mutane. TaimayinMu farat ɗaya da mutum a kan makarantin Chat Person yana gaskata cẽwa hanyarmu yana ƙara saurar ajirar da su da gaskiyar da gaskiyar mutane da ke tsare shi a lokacin da ke riƙe tsarin maganar.", 'sk': 'Živčni modeli za ustvarjanje odzivov ustvarjajo odzive, ki so semantično verjetni, vendar niso nujno dejansko skladni z dejstvi, ki opisujejo osebnost govornika. Ti modeli so usposobljeni s popolnoma nadzorovanim učenjem, kjer objektivna funkcija komaj zajame dejansko doslednost. Predlagamo natančno nastavitev teh modelov z okrepitvijo učenja in učinkovito funkcijo nagrajevanja, ki izrecno zajame skladnost med odzivom in osebnimi dejstvi ter semantično verjetnostjo. Naše avtomatične in človeške ocene korpusa PersonaChat potrjujejo, da naš pristop povečuje stopnjo odzivov, ki so dejansko skladni z osebnimi dejstvi, v primerjavi s svojim nadzorovanim kolegom, hkrati pa ohranja jezikovno kakovost odzivov.', 'bo': 'དཔེ་དབུང་གི་མིག མིག་གཟུགས་འདི་དག་གི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ལས་འཆར་སྟོན་ཐལ་ཡོད་མིན་དཔྱད་རྗེས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་འདི་དག་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། ལས ང་ཚོའི་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་མིའི་རྩིས་པོ་ཞིག་གི་གོ་སྐབས་ཡོད་པའི་མི་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ནི། ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བའི་ཚད་ལ་གཞན'}
{'en': 'PolyLM : Learning about Polysemy through Language Modeling', 'fr': 'PolyLM\xa0: Apprentissage de la polysémie par la modélisation du langage', 'pt': 'PolyLM: Aprendendo sobre a polissemia por meio da modelagem de linguagem', 'ar': 'PolyLM: التعلم عن تعدد المعاني من خلال نمذجة اللغة', 'es': 'PolyLM: Aprender sobre la polisemia a través del modelado del lenguaje', 'ja': 'PolyLM ：言語モデリングによる多義性の学習', 'ru': 'PolyLM: Изучение полисемии с помощью языкового моделирования', 'hi': 'PolyLM: भाषा मॉडलिंग के माध्यम से Polysemy के बारे में सीखना', 'zh': 'PolyLM:语言建模学多义词', 'ga': 'PolyLM: Foghlaim faoi Polysemy trí Shamhaltú Teanga', 'hu': 'PolyLM: Ismerje meg a Polyszemiát a nyelvmodellezéssel', 'el': 'Μάθετε για την Πολυσημία μέσω της Γλωσσικής Μοντελοποίησης', 'ka': 'Name', 'kk': 'PolyLM: Тіл үлгісімен Polysemy туралы оқыту', 'it': 'PolyLM: Imparare a conoscere Polysemy attraverso la modellazione linguistica', 'lt': 'PoliLM: Mokymasis apie polizimiją naudojant kalbų modeliavimą', 'mk': 'PolyLM: Учење за полизимија преку моделирање јазик', 'ms': 'PolyLM: Learning about Polysemy through Language Modeling', 'ml': 'പോളിഎല്\u200dഎം: ഭാഷ മോഡേലിലൂടെ പഠിക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'PolyLM: Tagħlim dwar il-Poliżmija permezz tal-Mudellar tal-Lingwi', 'mn': 'PolyLM: Холбоо загварын тухай', 'no': 'PolyLM: Læring om polysemy gjennom språk- modellering', 'pl': 'PolyLM: Nauka o polisemii poprzez modelowanie języka', 'ro': 'PolyLM: Învățarea despre Polysemy prin modelarea limbilor străine', 'sr': 'PolyLM: Učenje o polizemiji kroz Modeliranje jezika', 'sv': 'PolyLM: Att lära sig om Polysemy genom språkmodellering', 'so': 'PolyLM: Waxbarashada la xiriira Polysemy', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'போலிஎல்எம்: மொழி மாதிரி மூலம் போலிஸ்மி பற்றிய கற்றல்', 'ur': 'PolyLM: زبان موڈلینگ کے ذریعہ پولیسیمی کے بارے میں سیکھنا', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'PolyLM: Learning about Polysemy through Language Modeling', 'da': 'PolyLM: Lære om Polysemy gennem sprogmodellering', 'nl': 'PolyLM: Leren over polysemie door middel van taalmodellering', 'bg': 'Научаване на полисемията чрез езиково моделиране', 'hr': 'PolyLM: Naučenje o Polysemiji kroz Modeliranje jezika', 'id': 'PolyLM: Belajar tentang Polysemy melalui Modeling Bahasa', 'fa': 'PolyLM: یاد گرفتن درباره پولیسیمی از طریق مدل زبان', 'sw': 'PolyLM: Kujifunza kuhusu Polysemy kupitia Utawala wa Lugha', 'ko': 'PolyLM: 언어 모델링을 통한 다의어 학습', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'PolyLM:', 'hy': 'PolyLM: Learning about Polysemy through Language Modeling', 'de': 'PolyLM: Lernen über Polysemie durch Sprachmodellierung', 'tr': 'PolyLM: Dil nusgasyny bilen öwrenmek', 'bn': 'PolyLM: Learning about Polysemy through Language Modeling', 'ca': 'PolyLM: Learning about Polysemy through Language Modeling', 'cs': 'PolyLM: Učení se o polysemii prostřednictvím jazykového modelování', 'az': 'PolyLM: Dil Modelin톛 g칬r톛 Polysemy haqq캼nda 칬yr톛nm톛k', 'fi': 'PolyLM: Polysemian oppiminen kielimallinnuksen avulla', 'bs': 'PolyLM: Naučenje o Polysemiji kroz Modeliranje jezika', 'et': 'PolyLM: Polüseemia õppimine keele modelleerimise kaudu', 'sq': 'PolyLM: Mësimi për polizimin nëpërmjet modelimit të gjuhës', 'jv': 'poliLM: lian tentang karo polisemy', 'sk': 'PolyLM: Učenje o polisemiji skozi jezikovno modeliranje', 'he': 'PolyLM: ללמוד על פוליזמיה דרך מודל שפה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་མ་དབྱིབས་བསྒྱུར་བའི་སྐོར་གྱི་ཆེ་རྩལ་བ།'}
{'en': 'To avoid the meaning conflation deficiency of word embeddings, a number of models have aimed to embed individual word senses. These methods at one time performed well on tasks such as word sense induction (WSI), but they have since been overtaken by task-specific techniques which exploit contextualized embeddings. However, sense embeddings and contextualization need not be mutually exclusive. We introduce PolyLM, a method which formulates the task of learning sense embeddings as a language modeling problem, allowing contextualization techniques to be applied. PolyLM is based on two underlying assumptions about word senses : firstly, that the probability of a word occurring in a given context is equal to the sum of the probabilities of its individual senses occurring ; and secondly, that for a given occurrence of a word, one of its senses tends to be much more plausible in the context than the others. We evaluate PolyLM on WSI, showing that it performs considerably better than previous sense embedding techniques, and matches the current state-of-the-art specialized WSI method despite having six times fewer parameters. Code and pre-trained models are available at https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'ar': 'لتجنب "نقص اختلاط المعنى" لتضمين الكلمات ، هدفت عدد من النماذج إلى تضمين معاني الكلمات الفردية. أدت هذه الأساليب في وقت واحد أداءً جيدًا في مهام مثل استقراء معنى الكلمات (WSI) ، ولكن تم تجاوزها منذ ذلك الحين بواسطة تقنيات خاصة بالمهمة التي تستغل الزخارف السياقية. ومع ذلك ، لا يجب أن تكون حفلات الزفاف والسياق متعارضة. نحن نقدم PolyLM ، وهي طريقة تصيغ مهمة تعلم الزخارف الحسية كمشكلة لنمذجة اللغة ، مما يسمح بتطبيق تقنيات السياق. يعتمد PolyLM على افتراضين أساسيين حول حاسة الكلمات: أولاً ، أن احتمال حدوث كلمة في سياق معين يساوي مجموع احتمالات حدوث حواسها الفردية ؛ وثانيًا ، أنه بالنسبة لحدوث معين للكلمة ، تميل إحدى معانيها إلى أن تكون منطقية في السياق أكثر من غيرها. نقوم بتقييم PolyLM على WSI ، ونظهر أنه يؤدي بشكل أفضل بكثير من تقنيات تضمين المعنى السابقة ، ويتطابق مع طريقة WSI المتخصصة الحالية على الرغم من وجود معلمات أقل بست مرات. يتوفر الكود والنماذج المدربة مسبقًا على https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'es': 'Para evitar la «deficiencia de combinación de significados» de la incrustación de palabras, varios modelos han tenido como objetivo integrar los sentidos de las palabras individuales. En algún momento, estos métodos funcionaron bien en tareas como la inducción del sentido de palabras (WSI), pero desde entonces han sido superados por técnicas específicas de tareas que explotan las incrustaciones contextualizadas. Sin embargo, la incorporación de los sentidos y la contextualización no tienen por qué ser mutuamente excluyentes. Presentamos PolyLM, un método que formula la tarea de aprender la incrustación de sentidos como un problema de modelado del lenguaje, lo que permite aplicar técnicas de contextualización. PolyLM se basa en dos suposiciones subyacentes sobre los sentidos de las palabras: en primer lugar, que la probabilidad de que una palabra aparezca en un contexto dado es igual a la suma de las probabilidades de que ocurran sus sentidos individuales; y en segundo lugar, que para una aparición dada de una palabra, uno de sus sentidos tiende a ser mucho más plausible en el contexto que los demás. Evaluamos PolyLM en WSI, demostrando que funciona considerablemente mejor que las técnicas de incrustación de sentido anteriores, y coincide con el método WSI especializado de última generación actual a pesar de tener seis veces menos parámetros. El código y los modelos preentrenados están disponibles en https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'fr': "Pour éviter le «\xa0manque d'amalgame de sens\xa0» des intégrations de mots, un certain nombre de modèles ont cherché à intégrer les sens individuels des mots. Ces méthodes ont déjà donné de bons résultats sur des tâches telles que l'induction de sens des mots (WSI), mais elles ont depuis été dépassées par des techniques spécifiques à des tâches qui exploitent des intégrations contextualisées. Toutefois, l'intégration des sens et la contextualisation ne doivent pas nécessairement s'exclure mutuellement. Nous présentons PolyLM, une méthode qui formule la tâche d'apprentissage des intégrations de sens comme un problème de modélisation du langage, permettant d'appliquer des techniques de contextualisation. PolyLM est basé sur deux hypothèses sous-jacentes concernant les sens des mots\xa0: premièrement, que la probabilité qu'un mot apparaisse dans un contexte donné est égale à la somme des probabilités de l'apparition de ses sens individuels\xa0; et deuxièmement, que pour une occurrence donnée d'un mot, l'un de ses sens tend à être beaucoup plus plausible dans le contexte par rapport aux autres. Nous évaluons PolyLM sur WSI, montrant qu'il fonctionne considérablement mieux que les techniques d'intégration de sens précédentes et qu'il correspond à la méthode WSI spécialisée de pointe actuelle malgré six fois moins de paramètres. Le code et les modèles pré-entraînés sont disponibles sur https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.", 'pt': 'Para evitar a “deficiência de conflação de significado” das incorporações de palavras, vários modelos têm como objetivo incorporar sentidos de palavras individuais. Esses métodos, ao mesmo tempo, tiveram um bom desempenho em tarefas como indução de sentido de palavra (WSI), mas desde então foram ultrapassados por técnicas específicas de tarefa que exploram embeddings contextualizados. No entanto, a incorporação de sentido e a contextualização não precisam ser mutuamente exclusivas. Apresentamos o PolyLM, um método que formula a tarefa de aprender a incorporação de sentidos como um problema de modelagem de linguagem, permitindo a aplicação de técnicas de contextualização. O PolyLM é baseado em duas suposições básicas sobre os sentidos das palavras: primeiro, que a probabilidade de uma palavra ocorrer em um determinado contexto é igual à soma das probabilidades de seus sentidos individuais ocorrerem; e em segundo lugar, que para uma dada ocorrência de uma palavra, um de seus sentidos tende a ser muito mais plausível no contexto do que os outros. Avaliamos o PolyLM no WSI, mostrando que ele tem um desempenho consideravelmente melhor do que as técnicas de incorporação de sentido anteriores e corresponde ao método WSI especializado de última geração atual, apesar de ter seis vezes menos parâmetros. Código e modelos pré-treinados estão disponíveis em https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'ja': '単語埋め込みの「意味のコンフレーションの欠陥」を回避するために、いくつかのモデルは、個々の単語の意味を埋め込むことを目指してきた。 これらの方法は、一時期、単語センス帰納法（ WSI ）などのタスクでうまく機能しましたが、その後、コンテキスト化された埋め込みを利用するタスク固有のテクニックに追い越されました。 しかし、センス埋め込みとコンテキスト化は、相互に排他的である必要はありません。 PolyLMを導入し、言語モデリングの問題としてのセンス埋め込みを学習するという課題を定式化し、文脈化技術の応用を可能にする方法を紹介した。 PolyLMは、単語の感覚に関する2つの基本的な仮定に基づいています。1つ目は、与えられた文脈で発生する単語の確率が、その個々の感覚が発生する確率の合計に等しいということです。2つ目は、単語の特定の発生について、その感覚の1つは、他のものよりも文脈ではるかに妥当である傾向があるということです。 WSI上でPolyLMを評価し、従来のSENSE埋め込み技術よりもかなり優れた性能を発揮し、パラメータが6倍少ないにもかかわらず、現在の最先端の専用WSI方法と一致することを示します。 コードと事前トレーニング済みモデルは、https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLMで入手できます。', 'zh': '避词嵌"义混为一谈缺陷",诸模形旨在嵌单词义。 其法一度在诸如词义归(WSI)之类为善,然后已用上下文嵌特定术所代。 然人情不必相排。 余言PolyLM,此将学感官销入之法,许以上下文建模之术。 PolyLM词义二本:一曰给定上下文概率曰官概率。 其次,于一单词之给定见,其一感官在上下文中,往往得其理。 估PolyLM于WSI,明其性多于感官,而配WSI于先进,虽参数少六倍。 代码与豫教者,https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM。', 'ru': 'Чтобы избежать «дефицита смыслового слияния» вложений слов, ряд моделей стремились внедрить отдельные смыслы слов. Эти методы в свое время хорошо справлялись с такими задачами, как индукция смысла слова (WSI), но с тех пор они были перегружены специфическими для задач методами, которые используют контекстуализированные вложения. Однако смысловые встраивания и контекстуализация не обязательно должны быть взаимоисключающими. Мы представляем PolyLM, метод, который формулирует задачу изучения смысловых вложений как задачу языкового моделирования, позволяя применять методы контекстуализации. PolyLM основывается на двух основополагающих предположениях о смыслах слова: во-первых, вероятность того, что слово происходит в данном контексте, равна сумме вероятностей его отдельных чувств; и, во-вторых, то, что для данного случая слова один из его чувств имеет тенденцию быть гораздо более правдоподобным в контексте, чем другие. Мы оцениваем PolyLM на WSI, показывая, что она работает значительно лучше, чем предыдущие методы встраивания смысла, и соответствует современному специализированному методу WSI, несмотря на то, что имеет в шесть раз меньше параметров. Код и предварительно обученные модели доступны по ссылке https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'hi': 'शब्द एम्बेडिंग के "अर्थ कन्फ्लेशन की कमी" से बचने के लिए, कई मॉडलों ने व्यक्तिगत शब्द इंद्रियों को एम्बेड करने का लक्ष्य रखा है। इन विधियों ने एक समय में शब्द सेंस इंडक्शन (डब्ल्यूएसआई) जैसे कार्यों पर अच्छा प्रदर्शन किया, लेकिन तब से उन्हें कार्य-विशिष्ट तकनीकों द्वारा आगे बढ़ा दिया गया है जो प्रासंगिक एम्बेडिंग का शोषण करते हैं। हालांकि, भावना एम्बेडिंग और प्रासंगिकता पारस्परिक रूप से अनन्य होने की आवश्यकता नहीं है। हम PolyLM, एक विधि है जो एक भाषा मॉडलिंग समस्या के रूप में सीखने की भावना embeddings के कार्य को तैयार करता है, contextualization तकनीकों को लागू करने की अनुमति पेश करते हैं। पॉलीएलएम शब्द इंद्रियों के बारे में दो अंतर्निहित मान्यताओं पर आधारित है: सबसे पहले, किसी दिए गए संदर्भ में होने वाले किसी शब्द की संभावना उसके व्यक्तिगत इंद्रियों की संभावनाओं के योग के बराबर है; और दूसरी बात, कि एक शब्द की किसी दी गई घटना के लिए, इसकी इंद्रियों में से एक दूसरों की तुलना में संदर्भ में बहुत अधिक प्रशंसनीय होती है। हम डब्ल्यूएसआई पर पॉलीएलएम का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, यह दिखाते हुए कि यह पिछली भावना एम्बेडिंग तकनीकों की तुलना में काफी बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है, और छह गुना कम पैरामीटर होने के बावजूद वर्तमान अत्याधुनिक विशेष डब्ल्यूएसआई विधि से मेल खाता है। कोड और पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित मॉडल https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM पर उपलब्ध हैं।', 'ga': "Chun “easnamh brí an chóimhcheangail” de leabú focal a sheachaint, tá sé mar aidhm ag roinnt samhlacha céadfaí focal aonair a leabú. D'fheidhmigh na modhanna seo go maith ag aon am amháin ar thascanna ar nós ionduchtú chiall na bhfocal (WSI), ach ó shin tá teicnící tasc-shonracha tar éis iad a shárú a bhaineann leas as leabaithe comhthéacsúla. Mar sin féin, ní gá go mbeadh leabú céadfaí agus comhthéacsú comheisiatach. Cuirimid PolyLM i láthair, modh a fhoirmíonn an tasc chun leabú braite a fhoghlaim mar fhadhb samhaltaithe teanga, rud a ligeann do theicnící comhthéacsaithe a chur i bhfeidhm. Tá PolyLM bunaithe ar dhá bhonn tuisceana maidir le céadfaí focal: ar an gcéad dul síos, go bhfuil an dóchúlacht go dtarlóidh focal i gcomhthéacs ar leith cothrom le suim na dóchúlachtaí go dtarlóidh a chéadfaí aonair; agus ar an dara dul síos, i gcás focal ar leith, go mbíonn claonadh ag ceann dá chéadfaí a bheith i bhfad níos sochreidte sa chomhthéacs ná na cinn eile. Déanaimid meastóireacht ar PolyLM ar WSI, ag taispeáint go bhfeidhmíonn sé i bhfad níos fearr ná teicnící leabú céadfaí roimhe seo, agus go dtagann sé leis an modh WSI speisialaithe atá ann faoi láthair, ainneoin go bhfuil sé huaire níos lú paraiméadair aige. Tá cód agus samhlacha réamhoilte ar fáil ag https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.", 'el': 'Για να αποφευχθεί η "ανεπάρκεια συγχώνευσης εννοιών" των ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων, ορισμένα μοντέλα έχουν ως στόχο να ενσωματώσουν μεμονωμένες αισθήσεις λέξεων. Αυτές οι μέθοδοι κάποτε λειτούργησαν καλά σε εργασίες όπως η επαγωγή της λέξης (αλλά από τότε έχουν ξεπεραστεί από τεχνικές που αφορούν συγκεκριμένες εργασίες, οι οποίες εκμεταλλεύονται ενσωμάτωση στο πλαίσιο. Ωστόσο, η ενσωμάτωση των αισθήσεων και η ενσωμάτωση στο πλαίσιο δεν χρειάζεται να αποκλειστούν αμοιβαία. Παρουσιάζουμε μια μέθοδο που διαμορφώνει το καθήκον της εκμάθησης των εννοιών ως πρόβλημα γλωσσικής μοντελοποίησης, επιτρέποντας την εφαρμογή τεχνικών πλαισίωσης. Το PolyLM βασίζεται σε δύο υποκείμενες υποθέσεις σχετικά με τις αισθήσεις λέξεων: πρώτον, ότι η πιθανότητα εμφάνισης μιας λέξης σε ένα δεδομένο πλαίσιο είναι ίση με το άθροισμα των πιθανών εμφάνισης των μεμονωμένων αισθήσεων της. και δεύτερον, ότι για μια δεδομένη εμφάνιση μιας λέξης, μια από τις αισθήσεις της τείνει να είναι πολύ πιο πιθανή στο πλαίσιο από τις άλλες. Αξιολογούμε το ΠολυLM σε ΠΣΙ, δείχνοντας ότι αποδίδει σημαντικά καλύτερα από τις προηγούμενες τεχνικές ενσωμάτωσης αισθήσεων, και ταιριάζει με την τρέχουσα εξειδικευμένη μέθοδο παρά το γεγονός ότι έχει έξι φορές λιγότερες παραμέτρους. Κώδικας και προ-εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα διατίθενται στη διεύθυνση: https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'hu': 'A szóbeágyazások "összefonódási hiányának" elkerülése érdekében számos modell célja az egyes szóérzékek beágyazása. Ezek a módszerek egykor jól teljesítettek olyan feladatokban, mint például a szó érzékelése indukció (WSI), de azóta megelőzték őket feladatspecifikus technikák, amelyek kihasználják a kontextuális beágyazásokat. Azonban az érzékek beágyazásának és kontextualizációjának nem kell kizárnia egymást. Bemutatjuk a PolyLM-t, egy olyan módszert, amely megfogalmazza az érzékelési beágyazások tanulási feladatát mint nyelvmodellezési problémát, lehetővé téve a kontextualizációs technikák alkalmazását. A PolyLM két alapvető feltételezésen alapul: először is, hogy egy adott kontextusban előforduló szó valószínűsége egyenlő az egyes érzékek előfordulásának valószínűségével; Másodszor, hogy egy adott szó esetén az egyik érzéke sokkal valószínűbb a kontextusban, mint a többi. WSI-n értékeljük a PolyLM-t, ami azt mutatja, hogy a korábbi érzékbeágyazási technikáknál lényegesen jobban teljesít, és megfelel a jelenlegi korszerű speciális WSI módszernek, annak ellenére, hogy hatszor kevesebb paraméter van. A kód és az előkészített modellek az alábbi címen érhetők el: https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'ka': 'სიტყვების "კონფლიციის განსხვავება" გამოცდილობა, რამდენიმე მოდელები უნდა ინდიველური სიტყვების სიტყვების განსხვავებას დაყენება. ამ მეტირები ერთ დროში კარგი გავაკეთებულია საქმებზე, როგორც სიტყვის სიტყვის ინდექცია (WSI), მაგრამ ისინი შეიძლება იყოს საქმების განსაკუთრებული ტექნოგიებით, რომლებიც კონტექსტ მაგრამ, სიგრძნობა და კონტექსტუალიზაცია არ უნდა იყოს ერთადერთად სკლუქციური. ჩვენ PolyLM-ს გამოყენებთ, რომელიც სწავლის სიგრძნობის შემდეგ პრობლემა, როგორც მუშაობის შემდეგ სიგრძნობის მოდელური პრობლემა გამოყენება, რომელიც შეუძლია PolyLM არის ორი ქვემოთ წარმოდგენების შესახებ სიტყვების სიტყვების შესახებ: პირველი, რომ სიტყვების შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც მოხდება კონტექსტში, უდრის სიტყვების შესაძლებლობა იყოს მისი ინდივე და მეორე, რომ ერთი სიტყვის განსაზღვრებულად ერთი სიტყვის უფრო უფრო მეტი იყოს კონტექსტში, ვიდრე სხვების განსაზღვრებულად. ჩვენ ვამუშაობთ PolyLM-ს WSI-ზე, რომელიც გამოჩვენება, რომ ეს უფრო უკეთესი გავაკეთებს წინა სიგრძნობის ტექნოგიებიდან, და შეგიძლიათ მიმდინარე სიგრძნობის სპეციალური WSI-ის პროცემის შე Name https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'it': 'Per evitare la "carenza di significato di conflagrazione" delle incorporazioni di parole, un certo numero di modelli hanno mirato a incorporare singoli sensi di parola. Questi metodi in un tempo hanno funzionato bene su compiti come l\'induzione del senso delle parole (WSI), ma da allora sono stati superati da tecniche task-specific che sfruttano incorporazioni contestualizzate. Tuttavia, l\'incorporazione dei sensi e la contestualizzazione non devono escludersi a vicenda. Introducemo PolyLM, un metodo che formula il compito di apprendere le incorporazioni sensoriali come un problema di modellazione linguistica, consentendo di applicare tecniche di contestualizzazione. PolyLM si basa su due ipotesi sottostanti sui sensi delle parole: in primo luogo, che la probabilità che una parola si verifichi in un dato contesto è uguale alla somma delle probabilità che i suoi sensi individuali si verifichino; e in secondo luogo, che per un dato verificarsi di una parola, uno dei suoi sensi tende ad essere molto più plausibile nel contesto rispetto agli altri. Valutiamo PolyLM su WSI, dimostrando che funziona notevolmente meglio rispetto alle precedenti tecniche di sense embedding, e corrisponde all\'attuale metodo WSI specializzato allo stato dell\'arte nonostante abbia sei volte meno parametri. Codice e modelli pre-addestrati sono disponibili all\'indirizzo https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'lt': 'Siekiant išvengti žodžių įterpimo "reikšmingo konfliacijos trūkumo", keli modeliai siekė įterpti atskirus žodžių jutimus. Šie metodai vienu metu buvo gerai atliekami tokiose užduotyse kaip žodžio jutimo indukcija (WSI), tačiau nuo to laiko juos viršijo konkrečiai užduotims būdingi metodai, kurie naudoja kontekstinius įterpimus. Tačiau supratimo įtraukimas ir kontekstualizavimas neturi būti tarpusavyje išskirtiniai. Mes įvedame PolyLM metodą, kuris formuluoja mokymosi jutimo įtraukimo užduotį kaip kalbų modeliavimo problem ą, leidžiantį taikyti kontekstualizavimo metodus. PoliLM grindžiama dviem pagrindinėmis prielaidomis apie žodžio jutimus: pirma, kad žodžio atsiradimo tam tikroje aplinkoje tikimybė yra lygi jo atskirų jutimų atsiradimo tikimybės sumai; ir antra, kad tam tikram žodžio pasikartojimui vienas iš jo jutimų paprastai yra daug patikimesnis kontekste nei kiti. Vertiname WSI poliLM, rodydami, kad jis gerokai geresnis už ankstesnius jutimo įterpimo metodus, ir atitinka dabartinį moderniausią specializuotą WSI metodą, nepaisant to, kad jis turi šešis kartus mažiau parametrų. Kodas ir iš anksto parengti modeliai pateikiami https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'mk': 'За да се избегне „значењето недостаток на конфлација“ на вградувањата на зборови, голем број модели имаат за цел вградување на индивидуални чувства на зборови. Овие методи во едно време беа извршени добро на задачи како што е индукција на зборовите чувства (WSI), но од тогаш беа преземени со техники специфични за задачите кои експлоатираат контекстуални вложувања. Сепак, чувствата и контекстуализацијата не мора да се взаемно ексклузивни. Ние го воведуваме PolyLM, метод кој ја формулира задачата за учење на смисла вградени како проблем со моделирање на јазиците, овозможувајќи да се применат техниките на контекстулизација. ПолиЛМ се базира на две основни претпоставки за зборовите сетила: прво, дека веројатноста на збор кој се случува во одреден контекст е еднаква на сумата на веројатностите на неговите индивидуални сетила кои се случуваат; и второ, дека за одредено појавување на збор, еден од неговите чувства обично е многу поверојатен во контекст од другите. Ние го проценуваме ПолиЛМ на ВСИ, покажувајќи дека функционира значително подобро од претходните техники на вградување на чувствата, и се совпаѓа со сегашниот најсовремен специјализиран метод ВСИ и покрај тоа што има шест пати помалку параметри. Код и предобучени модели се достапни на https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'kk': 'Ендіру үшін бірнеше үлгі сөздер сезімдерін ендіру үшін бірнеше үлгі болады. Бұл әдістер бір уақытта сөздердің сезім индукциясы (WSI) секілді тапсырмаларда жақсы орындалады, бірақ оларды контекстуалды индукциялауды жұмыс істейтін тапсырмалардың арнайы технологиялары Бірақ сезімді ендіру мен контекстуализациялау қажет болмайды. Біз PolyLM дегенді тапсырманы тілді моделдеу мәселесі ретінде оқыту мүмкіндігін оқыту әдісін, контекстуализациялау техникаларын қолдануға мүмкіндік береді. PolyLM сөздер сезімі туралы екі негізінде негізінде тұрады: біріншіден, келтірілген контекстте болатын сөздің маңыздылығы, оның жеке сезімдерінің маңыздылығының жинағына тең болады. Екіншіден, келтірілген сөздердің бір сезімдері басқалардан артық болады. Біз WSI үшін PolyLM дегенді бағалаймыз. Бұл алдыңғы сезім ендіру технологияларынан артық жақсы жұмыс істейтінін көрсетеді. Алты рет төмен параметрлердің қазіргі жұмыс күйіне сәйкес келеді. Код мен алдын- ала оқылған үлгілер бар https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'ms': "Untuk menghindari 'kekurangan konflasi makna' bagi penyampaian perkataan, beberapa model telah bertujuan untuk penyampaian sens perkataan individu. Kaedah-kaedah ini pada satu masa dilakukan dengan baik pada tugas seperti induksi perasaan perkataan (WSI), tetapi mereka telah sejak itu ditangkap oleh teknik-teknik khusus tugas yang mengeksploitasi penyambungan kontekstual. Namun, penyelesaian perasaan dan kontekstualisasi tidak perlu saling eksklusif. Kami memperkenalkan PolyLM, satu kaedah yang membentuk tugas pembelajaran masuk akal sebagai masalah pemodelan bahasa, membolehkan teknik kontekstualisasi untuk dilaksanakan. PolyLM berdasarkan dua asumsi didasarkan mengenai perasaan perkataan: pertama, bahawa kebarangkalian perkataan yang berlaku dalam konteks tertentu adalah sama dengan jumlah kebarangkalian perasaan individu yang berlaku; dan kedua, untuk kejadian tertentu perkataan, salah satu perasaan itu cenderung menjadi jauh lebih percaya pada konteks daripada yang lain. Kami menilai PolyLM pada WSI, menunjukkan bahawa ia berfungsi jauh lebih baik daripada teknik penyambungan perasaan terdahulu, dan padan dengan kaedah WSI khusus state-of-the-art semasa walaupun mempunyai enam kali kurang parameter. Code and pre-trained models are available at  https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.", 'ml': "വാക്കുകളുടെ 'ക്രമീകരണത്തിന്റെ അസാധ്യത' എന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഒഴിവാക്കാന്\u200d, ഒരുപാട് മോഡലുകള്\u200d വ്യക്തിപരമായ വാക്കുകളുടെ ശേഖ ഒരിക്കല്\u200d ഈ രീതികള്\u200d വാക്ക് മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്ന ജോലികളില്\u200d നന്നായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. എന്നാല്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ചുള്ള പ്രത്യേകിച്ച ടെക് എന്നാലും വിചാരിക്കുന്നതിന്റെയും ആലോചിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്റെയും ആലോചിക്കുന്നതിന്റെയും തമ്മില്\u200d  നമ്മള്\u200d പോളിഎല്\u200dഎമിനെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഒരു രീതിയിലാണ് പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ജോലിയെ നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നത്, ഭാഷ മോഡലിങ് പ്രശ്നമായ പോളില്\u200dഎം വാക്കുകളെക്കുറിച്ചുള്ള രണ്ട് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഊഹികൾ അടിസ്ഥാനമാണ്: ആദ്യം ഒരു വാക്ക് സംഭവിക്കുന്നത് കൊടുത്തിരിക്കുന്ന കോണ്\u200dസെക്സ രണ്ടാമതായി, ഒരു വാക്കിന്റെ സംഭവം കൊണ്ട്, മറ്റുള്ളവരെക്കാളും അതിന്റെ വിചാരങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒന്നിനെക്കാള്\u200d വിനോദമുള്ളതാണ്. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d WSI-ല്\u200d പോളിഎല്\u200dഎമിനെ വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ഇത് മുമ്പുള്ള വിവേകത്തെക്കാള്\u200d വളരെ നല്ലതാണ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നതെന്ന് കാണിക്കുന്നു. ആറു തവണ കുറഞ് കോഡും മുമ്പ് പരിശീലന മോഡലുകളും ലഭ്യമാകുന്നു https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.", 'mt': 'Biex tiġi evitata n-“nuqqas ta’ konflazzjoni tat-tifsira” tal-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem, għadd ta’ mudelli kellhom l-għan li jinkorporaw sensi individwali tal-kliem. Dawn il-metodi f’ħin wieħed twettqu tajjeb fuq kompiti bħall-induzzjoni tas-sens tal-kliem (WSI), iżda minn dak iż-żmien ’l hawn ġew superati minn tekniki speċifiċi għall-kompiti li jisfruttaw inkorporazzjonijiet kuntestwalizzati. Madankollu, l-inkorporazzjoni tas-sens u l-kuntestwalizzazzjoni m’għandhomx għalfejn ikunu reċiprokament esklużivi. Aħna nintroduċu PolyLM, metodu li jifformula l-kompitu tal-inkorporazzjoni tas-sens tat-tagħlim bħala problem a ta’ mudell tal-lingwi, li jippermetti li jiġu applikati tekniki ta’ kuntestwalizzazzjoni. Il-PolyLM huwa bbażat fuq żewġ suppożizzjonijiet sottostanti dwar is-sensi tal-kelma: l-ewwel nett, li l-probabbiltà ta’ kelma li sseħħ f’kuntest partikolari hija ugwali għas-somma tal-probabbiltà tas-sensi individwali tagħha li jseħħu; and secondly, that for a given occurrence of a word, one of its senses tends to be much more plausible in the context than the others.  We evaluate PolyLM on WSI, showing that it performs considerably better than previous sense embedding techniques, and matches the current state-of-the-art specialized WSI method despite having six times fewer parameters.  Il-kodiċi u l-mudelli mħarrġa minn qabel huma disponibbli fuq https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'no': 'For å unngå «betydning av konfliktsfeil» av ordinnbygging, har mange modeller målt å innebæra individuelle ordsensar. Desse metodane er på ein gong utført godt på oppgåver som ordfølelse induksjon (WSI), men dei har siden gått opp av oppgåvespesifikke teknikk som eksploderer kontekstualiserte innbygging. Men følelsesinnbygging og kontekstualisering treng ikkje vera sammen eksklusiv. Vi introduserer PolyLM, eit metode som formerer oppgåva til å lære følelser som eit problem med språk- modellering, og tillater å bruka kontekstualiseringstekningar. PolyLM er basert på to underliggande antar om ordsensar: først, at sannsynligheten for eit ord som skjer i eit gitt kontekst er lik summen av sannsynlighetane for individuelle sensar som skjer. Og for andre, at for eit oppgjevne oppføring av eit ord, er ein av sine følelser tendens til å vera mykje meir tilgjengeleg i konteksten enn andre. Vi evaluerer polyLM på WSI, som viser at det utfører mykje bedre enn førre følelse innbæringsteknikkar, og passar til den gjeldande spesialiserte WSI-metoden, selv om det har seks ganger mindre parametra. Name https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'mn': 'Үнэндээ "зөрчилдөөн бус байдлыг" гэсэн утгатай байдлыг алдахын тулд хэд хэдэн загвар нь нэг үг мэдрэмжүүдийг оруулах зорилготой. Нэг удаа эдгээр арга зам нь үг мэдрэмжтэй сэтгэл хөдлөлийн даалгаврууд дээр сайн ажилладаг. Гэхдээ эдгээр арга замбарааллын тодорхой технологиуд орчин үеийн даалгаврыг ашигладаг. Гэвч мэдрэмж, нөхцөл байдлын тухай хоорондоо холбоотой байх хэрэггүй. Бид PolyLM-г танилцуулдаг. Энэ нь хэл загварын бодлого болгон суралцах мэдрэмжүүдийн даалгаврыг тодорхойлох арга юм. PolyLM нь үгийн мэдрэмжтэй тухай хоёр үндсэн тодорхойлолт дээр суурилсан: эхлээд, өгөгдсөн тодорхойлолтын магадлал нь өөрийн мэдрэмжүүдийн тодорхойлолтын нийлбэртэй тэнцүү байх магадлал юм. Хоёрдугаарт, нэг үгийн тохиолдлын тулд, нэг мэдрэмж нь бусдаас илүү итгэлтэй байдаг. Бид WSI дээр PolyLM-г үнэлдэг. Энэ нь өмнөх мэдрэмжээс илүү сайн үйлдвэрлэж байгааг харуулж байна. Энэ нь 6 дахин бага параметр байсан ч гэсэн одоогийн урлагийн мэргэжлийн WSI хувилбартай холбоотой. Код болон урьд сургалтын загварууд https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'pl': 'Aby uniknąć "niedoboru połączenia znaczeń" osadzeń słów, wiele modeli ma na celu osadzenie poszczególnych zmysłów słowa. Metody te w pewnym czasie sprawdzały się dobrze w zadaniach takich jak indukcja zmysłu słowa (WSI), ale od tego czasu zostały wyprzedzone technikami specyficznymi dla zadań, które wykorzystują kontekstualizowane osadzenia. Jednak osadzenie zmysłów i kontekstualizacja nie muszą się wzajemnie wykluczać. Przedstawiamy metodę PolyLM, która formułuje zadanie uczenia się osadzeń zmysłów jako problem modelowania języka, umożliwiając zastosowanie technik kontekstualizacji. PoliLM opiera się na dwóch podstawowych założeniach dotyczących zmysłów słowa: po pierwsze, że prawdopodobieństwo wystąpienia słowa w danym kontekście jest równe sumie prawdopodobieństw wystąpienia jego indywidualnych zmysłów; a po drugie, że dla danego wystąpienia słowa jeden z jego zmysłów ma tendencję być znacznie wiarygodniejszy w kontekście niż inne. Oceniamy PolyLM na WSI, pokazując, że działa znacznie lepiej niż dotychczasowe techniki osadzania zmysłów i pasuje do aktualnej, specjalistycznej metody WSI pomimo sześciokrotnie mniejszej liczby parametrów. Kod i wstępnie przeszkolone modele są dostępne pod adresem: https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'si': "වචනය සම්බන්ධ විශ්වාසය 'අදහස් අවශ්\u200dය' කිරීමට, ප්\u200dරතිකාර වචනය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ප්\u200dරතිකාර වචනය සම්බන්ධ ව මේ විධානය එක වෙලාවට හොඳ වැඩක් කරලා තියෙන්නේ වචන අදහස් විධානය (WSI) වලින්, නමුත් ඔවුන් වැඩක් විශේෂ විශේෂ විධානය නමුත්, සම්පූර්ණය සහ සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් අවශ්\u200dය නො අපි පොලිලිල්ම් විදියට පෙනුම් කරනවා, භාෂාව මොඩිල්ම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න වැඩක් ස පොලිලිල්ම් විශ්වාස දෙකට අධාරිත විශ්වාස කරන්නේ වචන සංවේදනය ගැන: මුලින්ම, දෙන්න ප්\u200dරතිස්ථේපනයේ වචන සංවේදනය සමාන්\u200dය වෙන් දෙවෙනියෙන්, ඒක වචනයක් වෙනුවෙන්, ඒකේ අවස්ථාවක් වෙනුවෙන් වඩා විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙයි. අපි WSI වල පොලිල්ම් විශ්වාස කරනවා, පෙන්වනවා ඒක පිළිබඳ තාක්ෂණාවට වඩා හොඳයි කියලා, ඒ වගේම තාක්ෂණය සම්බන්ධ විශේෂිත WSI විධාන Name https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.", 'ro': 'Pentru a evita "deficiența de confundare a semnificației" a încorporărilor de cuvinte, o serie de modele au avut ca scop încorporarea simțurilor individuale ale cuvintelor. Aceste metode la un moment dat au funcționat bine în sarcini cum ar fi inducția sensului cuvântului (WSI), dar de atunci au fost depășite de tehnici specifice sarcinilor care exploatează încorporările contextualizate. Cu toate acestea, încorporarea simțurilor și contextualizarea nu trebuie să se excludă reciproc. Introducem PolyLM, o metodă care formulează sarcina învățării încorporărilor simțurilor ca problemă de modelare a limbilor, permițând aplicarea tehnicilor de contextualizare. PolyLM se bazează pe două ipoteze fundamentale despre simțurile cuvintelor: în primul rând, că probabilitatea ca un cuvânt să apară într-un context dat este egală cu suma probabilităților apariției simțurilor sale individuale; și în al doilea rând, că pentru o anumită apariție a unui cuvânt, unul dintre simțurile sale tinde să fie mult mai plauzibil în context decât celelalte. Evaluăm PolyLM pe WSI, arătând că performează considerabil mai bine decât tehnicile anterioare de încorporare a simțurilor și se potrivește cu metoda WSI specializată de ultimă generație, deși are de șase ori mai puțini parametri. Codul și modelele pre-instruite sunt disponibile la adresa https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'sr': 'Da bi izbjegao "nedostatak konflikcije" reèi ugraðenja, broj modela je ciljao da ukljuèi pojedinačne osjeæaje reèi. Ove metode su u jednom trenutku izvršene dobro na zadatke poput indukcije reèi smisla (WSI), ali su od tada prešle tehnike posebnih zadataka koje iskorištavaju kontekstualizirane integracije. Međutim, osećaj ugrađenja i kontekstualizacija ne trebaju biti međusobno ekskluzivan. Predstavljamo PolyLM, metodu koja formuliše zadatak učenja osjećaja ugrađenja jezika kao problem modeliranja jezika, omogućavajući primjenu tehnika kontekstualizacije. PolyLM se temelji na dva temeljna pretpostavka o čulima reči: prvo, da je verovatnoća reči koja se pojavljuje u određenom kontekstu jednaka sumi verovatnosti njegovih pojedinačnih čula koja se pojavljuje; I drugo, da za određenu pojavu reči, jedna od njegovih čula je mnogo više uvjerljiva u kontekstu od drugih. Procjenjujemo PolyLM na WSI, pokazujući da izvodi mnogo bolje od prethodnih tehnika integracije smisla, i odgovara trenutnom metodu specijalizovanog WSI, uprkos što ima šest puta manje parametara. Kod i predobučeni modeli su dostupni na https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'sv': 'För att undvika "innebörden av sammanlänkning brist" av ord inbäddningar har ett antal modeller syftat till att bädda in enskilda ordsinnen. Dessa metoder fungerade en gång bra på uppgifter som ordsinnesindikation (WSI), men de har sedan dess överträffats av uppgiftsspecifika tekniker som utnyttjar kontextuella inbäddningar. Sensinbäddningar och kontextualisering behöver dock inte utesluta varandra. Vi introducerar PolyLM, en metod som formulerar uppgiften att lära sig sensinbäddningar som ett språkmodelleringsproblem, vilket gör det möjligt att tillämpa kontextualiseringstekniker. PolyLM bygger på två underliggande antaganden om ordsinnen: för det första att sannolikheten för att ett ord inträffar i ett givet sammanhang är lika med summan av sannolikheterna för att dess individuella sinnen inträffar; och för det andra, att för en given förekomst av ett ord tenderar ett av dess sinnen att vara mycket mer troligt i sammanhanget än de andra. Vi utvärderar PolyLM på WSI, vilket visar att den presterar betydligt bättre än tidigare sense embedding tekniker, och matchar den nuvarande state-of-the-art specialiserade WSI metoden trots att den har sex gånger färre parametrar. Kod och färdigutbildade modeller finns tillgängliga på https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'so': "Si uu uga fogaado noocyada 'baahida dhibaatada' ee hadalka ku qoran, tusaalooyin badan ayaa ku talo galay inay soo bandhigaan sano kali ah. Wadamadaas mar qudha waxay si wanaagsan u sameeyeen shaqaalaha sida warqada waxgarashada (WSI), laakiin waa laga qabsaday qaabab gaar ah oo shaqada ku baaraandegay meelaha la fuulo. Si kastaba ha ahaatee marka la soo wareego iyo ka fekeridda looma baahna inay iskaashataan. Waxaynu soo bandhignaa PolyLM, qaab ah oo u sameynaya shaqada waxbarashada oo ka mid ah dhibaato tusaale ahaan luqada, taasoo u ogolaada in la codsado qalabka dib u dhigista. PolyLM wuxuu ku saleysan yahay laba malooyin oo hoos u ah oo ku saabsan maandooriyaha ereyga: ugu horeysa, suurtagalka ereyga ka soo baxa marka lagu jiro waa mid la mid ah tirada suurtagalka ah oo ka mid ah fikirradiisa shakhsiga ah; labaadna, in marka hadal la siiyo, mid ka mid ah xilliyadiisu waa mid ka faa’iido badan yihiin xiliga kuwa kale. Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa PolyLM oo ku qoran WSI, waxaynu caddaynaynaa inay si aad uga wanaagsan tahay qalabka hore oo ka mid ah qalabka wax lagu soo beddelayo, waxayna u eg tahay qaababka dhaqanka ee qoriga ah ee WSI xitaa in kastoo ay leedahay lix jeer oo ka yar. Codeynta iyo modelalka horay loo tababaray waxaa laga helaa https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.", 'ur': "لفظ انڈینگ کے 'مطلب مختلف کمزوری' سے منع کرنے کے لئے بہت سی موڈل ایک شخصی لفظ سنسوں میں داخل کرنے کا ارادہ کیا گیا ہے. یہ طریقے ایک دفعہ کاموں پر اچھی طریقہ کرتے ہیں جیسے کلمات سمجھ اینڈک (WSI) لیکن اس سے پہلے ان کو کام کے مطابق طریقے سے پکڑے گئے ہیں جو contextualized embeddings میں استعمال کرتے ہیں. اگرچہ، سمجھ کے مطابق انڈینگ اور آزمائش کے مطابق ایک دوسرے سے خالص نہیں ہونا ضرورت ہے. ہم PolyLM کو معرفی کرتے ہیں، ایک طریقہ جس نے سمجھ کی تعلیم کے کام کو ایک زبان موڈلینگ مسئلہ کے طور پر فرمولڈ کرتا ہے، اور اس کے لئے متوسط تخصیل کی استعمال کرنا اجازت دیتا ہے. PolyLM کلمات حس کے بارے میں دو بنیادی فرضیوں پر بنیاد ہے: پہلی بار، کہ ایک کلمات کی شانسی ایک مقررہ متصل میں اتر رہی ہے اس کے فرضی حس کے احتمال کے جمع سے برابر ہے۔ اور دوسرا یہ ہے کہ ایک کلمہ کے بارے میں اس کا ایک احساس دوسرے سے زیادہ مطمئن ہوتا ہے۔ ہم WSI پر PolyLM کا ارزش کررہے ہیں، اس کو دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ اگلے سمجھ کے مطابق بہتر عمل کرتا ہے، اور چھ دفعہ کم پارامیٹروں کے بغیر اس حال میں کہ اس کے مطابق موجود state-of-the-art مخصوص WSI طریقہ سے ملتا ہے. کوڈ اور پیش ترسین نمڈلوں میں موجود ہیں https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.", 'ta': "வார்த்தை உள்ளிடுவதின் 'அர்த்தமான கட்டுப்பாட்டு குறைந்தது' என்பதை தவிர்க்க, பல மாதிரிகள் தனிப்பட்ட வார்த்தை உணர்வுகளை  வார்த்தை உணர்வு தொடக்கம் (WSI) போன்ற செயல்களில் இந்த முறைகள் ஒரு முறையில் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்டது, ஆனால் செயல் குறிப்பிட்ட தொழில்நுட்ப தொழில ஆனால், உணர்வு பொருட்கள் மற்றும் சிந்தனைப்படுத்தல் ஒருவருக்கொருவர் தனிப்பயனாக இருக்க வேண்டாம். நாம் போலிஎம், கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் உணர்வு செயலை மொழி மாதிரியான பிரச்சினையாக உருவாக்கும் முறைமையில், போலிஎம் முறைமையை குறிப்ப போலிஎல்எம் வார்த்தை உணர்வுகளைப் பற்றிய இரண்டு அடிப்படையான எண்ணங்களை அடிப்படையில் உள்ளது: முதலில், கொடுக்கப்பட்ட ஒரு சொல்லாக்கு நடக்கும் சாத்தியம்  இரண்டாவதாக, ஒரு வார்த்தையின் நிகழ்விற்கு, அதன் உணர்வுகளில் ஒன்று மற்றவர்களை விட மிகவும் விளையாடுவதாக இருக்கும். WSI மீது போலிய்எம் மதிப்பிடுகிறோம். இது முந்தைய உணர்வு உள்ளிடப்படும் தொழில்நுட்பத்தை விட மிகவும் நல்லது செயல்படுகிறது மற்றும் ஆறு முறை குறைவாக இருந்த Code and pre-trained models are available at  https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.", 'vi': 'Để tránh sự thiếu hụt liên tưởng có nghĩa của sự nhúng vào từ, một số mô hình đã hướng tới việc nhúng các giác quan từ riêng biệt vào. Những phương pháp này đã từng thực hiện rất tốt các công việc như WSI (cấu tạo cảm nhận từ) nhưng chúng đã bị vượt qua bởi các kỹ thuật đặc nhiệm, khai thác các tình huống. Tuy nhiên, tình huống và tình hình không thể loại trừ lẫn nhau. Chúng tôi giới thiệu PolyLM, một phương pháp công bố nhiệm vụ nhận thức được sự nhúng vào như một vấn đề tạo mẫu ngôn ngữ, để có thể áp dụng các kỹ thuật định giá. PolyLM dựa trên hai giả thiết cơ bản về các giác quan từ: đầu tiên, rằng khả năng của một từ diễn ra trong một tình huống nào đó bằng với tổng số khả năng ngẫu nhiên của các giác quan cá nhân của nó xảy ra; và thứ hai, rằng một trong các giác quan của nó có xu hướng hợp lý hơn nhiều so với những từ khác. Chúng tôi đánh giá PolyLM trên WSI, cho thấy nó được thực hiện tốt hơn nhiều so với các kỹ thuật trộn cảm giác trước, và trùng khớp với phương pháp WSI chuyên môn hiện thời, mặc dù có gấp sáu lần ít tham số hơn. Bộ mã và mẫu được huấn luyện sẵn sàng tại https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'uz': "Ko'pchilik modellarni bir so'zlarni bir so'zlar hisoblashga imkoniyat qiladi. Bu usullar bir marta, so'z ma'lum ishlarni (WSI) kabi ishlarda bajariladi, lekin ularning vazifalar hodisa teknologiga o'rganish mumkin. Bu vazifalar davom etiladi. Lekin, ma'lumotni o'zgartirish va taqdimlik boshqa bir-bir bo'lish kerak emas. Biz PolyLM (PolyLM), o'rganish imkoniyatini o'rganish vazifasini o'rganish muvaffaqiyatli tilni modellash muammolari sifatida o'rganish usulini ko'rsatish mumkin. Name and secondly, that for a given occurrence of a word, one of its senses tends to be much more plausible in the context than the others.  Biz WSI'da PolyLM haqida qiymatmiz, bu o'z oldingi o'ylab o'qituvchi tugmalardan juda yaxshi ko'rinishini ko'rsatamiz va 6 marta kamaytirish kerak bo'lsa, hozir soniyalarning hodisa WSI metodiga mos keladi. Kodlash va oldin taʼminlovchi modellar mavjud emas https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.", 'bg': 'За да се избегне "дефицитът на смесване на значението" на вграждането на думи, редица модели са насочени към вграждане на отделни думи сетива. Тези методи по едно време се представят добре при задачи като индукция на смисъла на думата (WSI), но оттогава те са изпреварвани от специфични задачи техники, които експлоатират контекстуализирани вграждания. Въпреки това, вграждането на сетива и контекстуализацията не е необходимо взаимно да се изключват. Представяме метод, който формулира задачата за изучаване на вграждането на сетива като проблем за езиково моделиране, позволяващ прилагането на техники за контекстуализация. PolyLM се основава на две основни предположения за словните сетива: първо, че вероятността дадена дума да се появи в даден контекст е равна на сумата от вероятностите за възникване на нейните индивидуални сетива; и второ, че за дадено появяване на дума, едно от сетивата му е много по-правдоподобно в контекста, отколкото другите. Ние оценяваме ПолиЛМ на WSI, показвайки, че той се представя значително по-добре от предишните техники за вграждане на сетива и съответства на съвременния специализиран метод на WSI, въпреки че има шест пъти по-малко параметри. Код и предварително обучени модели се предлагат на адрес: https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'hr': "Da bi se izbjegao 'nedostatak konflikcije' riječi ugrađenja, broj modela je ciljao uključiti pojedinačne osjećaje riječi. Ove metode su u jednom trenutku provedene dobro na zadatkima poput indukcije riječi smisla (WSI), ali su od tada prešle tehnike određenih zadataka koje koriste kontekstualizirane integracije. Međutim, osjećaj ugrađenja i kontekstualizacija ne trebaju biti međusobno ekskluzivan. Predstavljamo PolyLM, metodu koja formulira zadatak učenja osjećaja ugrađenja jezika kao problem modeliranja jezika, omogućavajući primjenu tehnika kontekstualizacije. PolyLM se temelji na dva temeljna pretpostavka o osjećajima riječi: prvo, da je vjerojatnost riječi koja se pojavljuje u određenom kontekstu jednaka sumi vjerojatnosti njegovih pojedinačnih čula koje se pojavljuju; I drugo, da za određenu pojavu riječi, jedna od njegovih osjećaja čini biti mnogo uvjerljivija u kontekstu od drugih. Procjenjujemo PolyLM na WSI, pokazujući da izvodi značajno bolje od prethodnih tehnika uključenja osjećaja i odgovara trenutnoj metodi specijaliziranog WSI, uprkos što ima šest puta manje parametara. Kod i predobučeni modeli su dostupni na https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.", 'de': 'Um den "Bedeutungsmangel" von Worteinbettungen zu vermeiden, haben mehrere Modelle das Ziel verfolgt, einzelne Wortsinne einzubetten. Diese Methoden haben früher bei Aufgaben wie Word Sense Induction (WSI) gut funktioniert, sind aber inzwischen von aufgabenspezifischen Techniken überholt worden, die kontextualisierte Einbettungen ausnutzen. Sinneseinbettungen und Kontextualisierung müssen sich jedoch nicht ausschließen. Wir stellen PolyLM vor, eine Methode, die die Aufgabe des Lernens von Sinneseinbettungen als Sprachmodellierungsproblem formuliert und Kontextualisierungstechniken ermöglicht. PolyLM basiert auf zwei zugrunde liegenden Annahmen über Wortsinne: erstens, dass die Wahrscheinlichkeit, dass ein Wort in einem gegebenen Kontext vorkommt, gleich der Summe der Wahrscheinlichkeiten seiner einzelnen Sinne ist; Und zweitens, dass für ein gegebenes Auftreten eines Wortes einer seiner Sinne im Kontext viel plausibler ist als die anderen. Wir evaluieren PolyLM auf WSI und zeigen, dass es deutlich besser als bisherige Sense Embedding Techniken funktioniert und trotz sechsmal weniger Parameter mit der aktuellen State-of-the-Art spezialisierten WSI Methode übereinstimmt. Code und vortrainierte Modelle sind erhältlich unter https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'da': "For at undgå den 'betydningsfulde sammenblanding mangel' af ord indlejringer har en række modeller tilstræbt at integrere individuelle ord sanser. Disse metoder fungerede på et tidspunkt godt på opgaver som ordsanseindusion (WSI), men de er siden blevet overhalet af opgavespecifikke teknikker, der udnytter kontekstualiserede indlejringer. Men sanseindsætninger og kontekstualisering behøver ikke udelukke hinanden. Vi introducerer PolyLM, en metode, der formulerer opgaven med at lære sansebelejringer som et sprogmodelleringsproblem, så kontekstualiseringsteknikker kan anvendes. PolyLM er baseret på to underliggende antagelser om ordsanser: For det første, at sandsynligheden for, at et ord opstår i en given sammenhæng er lig med summen af sandsynligheden for, at dets individuelle sanser opstår; og for det andet, at for en given forekomst af et ord, en af dets sanser har tendens til at være meget mere sandsynlig i sammenhængen end de andre. Vi evaluerer PolyLM på WSI, hvilket viser, at det fungerer betydeligt bedre end tidligere sense embedding teknikker, og matcher den nuværende state-of-the-art specialiserede WSI metode trods at have seks gange færre parametre. Kode og prætrænede modeller er tilgængelige på https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.", 'nl': "Om de 'betekenisversmeltingsdeficiĂ«ntie' van woordinsluitingen te voorkomen, hebben een aantal modellen tot doel om individuele woordzintuigen te integreren. Deze methoden presteerden op een gegeven moment goed bij taken zoals woordzintuiginductie (WSI), maar sindsdien zijn ze overgenomen door taakspecifieke technieken die gebruik maken van contextualiseerde embeddings. Sinnesinbeddingen en contextualisering hoeven elkaar echter niet uit te sluiten. We introduceren PolyLM, een methode die de taak van het leren van zintuiginbeddingen formuleert als een taalmodelleringsprobleem, waardoor contextualisatietechnieken kunnen worden toegepast. PolyLM is gebaseerd op twee onderliggende veronderstellingen over woordzintuigen: ten eerste, dat de waarschijnlijkheid dat een woord in een bepaalde context voorkomt gelijk is aan de som van de waarschijnlijkheid dat zijn individuele zintuigen optreden; en ten tweede, dat voor een gegeven verschijning van een woord, een van zijn zintuigen neigt veel plausibler te zijn in de context dan de andere. We evalueren PolyLM op WSI, waaruit blijkt dat het aanzienlijk beter presteert dan eerdere sense embedding technieken, en overeenkomt met de huidige state-of-the-art gespecialiseerde WSI methode ondanks zes keer minder parameters. Code en voorgetrainde modellen zijn beschikbaar op: https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.", 'fa': 'برای جلوگیری از ناتوانی معنی پیوند کلمه\u200cهای پیوند، تعدادی از مدل\u200cها هدف گرفته\u200cاند که حس\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای شخصی را پیوند کنند. این روش\u200cها در یک زمان در مورد کار\u200cهایی که به عنوان فعالیت احساس کلمه (WSI) انجام می\u200cدهند، خوب انجام می\u200cدهند، ولی از آن زمان، توسط فناوری\u200cهای خاص وظیفه\u200cای که از وسیله\u200cهای متوسط استفاده می\u200cکنند، آنها را گرفته\u200cاند. با این حال، احساس پیوند\u200cگیری\u200cها و محیط\u200cگیری\u200cها نیازی نیست که با هم خالص باشند. ما یک روش PolyLM را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که کار یادگیری حس را به عنوان یک مشکل مدل زبانی فرمول می\u200cکند، که اجازه می\u200cدهد تکنیک مدل\u200cسازی را اجازه دهد. پلیلیام بر اساس دو فرضیه\u200cهای بنیادی در مورد احساس کلمه است: اول، احتمال کلمه\u200cای که در یک محیط داده می\u200cشود، با جمع احتمال احساسات احساسات شخصی آن اتفاق می\u200cافتد برابر است. و دوم این است که برای اتفاق داده شدن یک کلمه، یکی از احساساتش در محیط بیشتر از بقیه قابل اعتماد است. ما polyLM را در WSI ارزیابی می کنیم، که نشان می دهد که آن به طور زیادی بهتر از فناوری\u200cهای پیدا کردن حس قبلی انجام می\u200cدهد، و با وجود داشتن شش بار کمتر پارامتر به حالت فعلی هنر متخصص WSI با هماهنگی می\u200cکند. کد و مدل پیش آموزش موجود است https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'id': "To avoid the 'meaning conflation deficiency' of word embeddings, a number of models have aimed to embed individual word senses.  Metode-metode ini pada suatu waktu dilakukan dengan baik pada tugas seperti induksi perasaan kata (WSI), tetapi mereka telah sejak itu ditangkap oleh teknik-teknik spesifik tugas yang mengeksploitasi embedding kontekstualisasi. Namun, penerbangan rasa dan kontekstualisasi tidak perlu saling eksklusif. Kami memperkenalkan PolyLM, metode yang membentuk tugas belajar masuk akal sebagai masalah model bahasa, memungkinkan teknik kontekstualisasi untuk diaplikasikan. PolyLM berdasarkan dua asumsi didasarkan tentang sensor kata: pertama, bahwa kemungkinan kata yang terjadi dalam konteks tertentu sama dengan jumlah kemungkinan dari sensor individunya yang terjadi; dan kedua, bahwa untuk kejadian tertentu dari kata, salah satu sensnya cenderung menjadi jauh lebih percaya dalam konteks daripada yang lainnya. Kami mengevaluasi PolyLM di WSI, menunjukkan bahwa ia berfungsi jauh lebih baik dari teknik pengangkutan perasaan sebelumnya, dan cocok dengan metode WSI yang terbaik saat ini meskipun memiliki enam kali kurang parameter. Code and pre-trained models are available at  https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.", 'tr': "Kelimeleriň 'hasaplanjaň azalygyndan çykmak üçin birnäçe nusgalar beýleki söz duýgularyny integre etmek amaçlandy. Bu yöntemler bir gezek söz duýgulary (WSI) ýaly zadlary gowy ýerine ýetirdi ýöne, ýöne bu yöntemden soňra görnüş tekniklerden uzaklaşdyrylýar. Emma duýgunlaşdyrmak we garaýyş etmek üçin bir-birinden daňlanan däl. Biz PolyLM'i, duýgulandyrma hasaplamasynyň işini dil modellendirmesi meselesi hökmünde, duýgulandyrma tekniklerini uygulamağa rugsat berýäris. PolyLM kelime duygu hakkında iki tane temel tahmin edildi: ilk olarak, verilen bir kontekstde gelen kelime olasılığı bireysel duygularının oluşan mümkünlüklerinin toplamına eşit olur; Ikinjisi bolsa, bir sözüň ýakynlanmasy üçin, duýgularynyň biri başgalaryndan köp ynamly bolar. WSI'de PolyLM'i deňleýäris we munuň öňki duýgulanma tekniklerinden has gowy bir şekilde üýtgedýändigini görkezýäris we häzirki möhüm taýýarlanma tekniklerine eşleýäris we 6 gezek düşür parameterler bolmasa bile eşleýäris. Häzirki görkezilen hatlar bar https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.", 'sw': "Ili kuepuka maana ya 'ukosefu wa ukosefu wa kujizuia' wa maneno, mifano kadhaa imelenga kuingiza hisia za maneno binafsi. Hatua hizi kwa wakati mmoja zilifanya vizuri katika kazi kama vile ufundi wa maneno yenye maana (WSI), lakini tangu sasa imekamatwa na mbinu maalumu za kazi ambazo zinatumia vifaa vinavyoendelea. Hata hivyo, hisia zinazoingia na kutafakari hazihitaji kuwa tofauti. We introduce PolyLM, a method which formulates the task of learning sense embeddings as a language modeling problem, allowing contextualization techniques to be applied.  PolyLM anategemea dhana mbili za msingi kuhusu hisia za maneno: kwanza, kwamba uwezekano wa neno linalotokea katika muktadha ulio pewa ni sawa na uwezekano wa hisia zake za watu binafsi zinazotokea; na pili, kwamba kwa kutokea kwa neno fulani, moja ya hisia zake bado inaonekana kuwa ya kucheza zaidi katika muktadha kuliko wengine. Tutathmini PolyLM kwenye WSI, tunaonyesha kwamba inafanya vizuri zaidi kuliko mbinu zilizopita zilizotengenezwa, na inalinganisha na hali ya sasa ya sanaa maalum ya WSI pamoja na kuwa na kipimo cha mara sita chache. Sheria na mifano ya zamani yanapatikana katika https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.", 'ko': "단어가 삽입된'의미 융합 결함'을 피하기 위해 많은 모델들이 한 단어의 의미를 삽입하는 데 목적을 두고 있다.이런 방법들은 의미 귀납(WSI)과 같은 임무에서 양호하게 나타났으나 나중에 언어 환경에 삽입된 임무의 특정 기술로 대체되었다.그러나 의미 삽입과 언어 환경화는 서로 배척할 필요가 없다.우리는 학습 감각을 언어 모델링 문제로 끼워 넣는 PolyM을 소개했고 언어 환경화 기술을 응용할 수 있도록 했다.PolyLM은 두 가지 의미에 대한 기본적인 가설을 바탕으로 한다. 첫째, 한 단어가 주어진 언어 환경에서 나타날 확률은 한 단어의 의미가 나타날 확률의 합과 같다.둘째, 한 단어의 특정한 출현에 대해 그의 감각 기관은 상하문에서 종종 다른 감각 기관보다 더 믿을 만하다.WSI에서 PolyLM에 대한 평가를 실시한 결과, 그 성능은 이전의 감지 삽입 기술보다 훨씬 좋고, 파라미터가 6배 적음에도 불구하고 현재 가장 선진적인 전용 WSI 방법과 일치한다.코드와 사전 교육 모델은https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.", 'hy': 'Որպեսզի խուսափենք բառերի ներդրման "նշանակալի կոնֆլացիայի բացակայությունից", մի շարք մոդելներ նպատակացել են ներդրել բառերի առանձին զգացմունքները: Այս մեթոդները մի ժամանակ լավ էին կատարվում այնպիսի խնդիրների վրա, ինչպիսիք են բառերի զգացմունքի ինդուկցիան, բայց դրանք այնուհետև գերազանցել են խնդիրների մասնավոր մեթոդներով, որոնք օգտագործում են կոնտեքստիալ ներդրումներ: Այնուամենայնիվ, զգայարանների ներգրավումները և կոնտեքստիալիզացիան պետք չէ միասին բացառություն ունենալ: We introduce PolyLM, a method which formulates the task of learning sense embeddings as a language modeling problem, allowing contextualization techniques to be applied.  PolyLM is based on two underlying assumptions about word senses: firstly, that the probability of a word occurring in a given context is equal to the sum of the probabilities of its individual senses occurring;  և երկրորդ, որ բառի որոշ պատճառով նրա զգացմունքներից մեկը հակված է ավելի հավատալի լինել կոնտեքստում, քան մյուսները: Մենք գնահատում ենք ՊոլիԼՄ-ը ՀԱՍ-ի վրա, ցույց տալով, որ այն ավելի լավ է աշխատում, քան նախորդ զգացմունքների ներգրավման մեթոդները, և համապատասխանում է ներկայիս ամենաբարձր մասնագիտացված ՀԱՍ-ի մեթոդներին, չնայած վեց անգամ ավելի քիչ պարամետ Կոդը և նախապատրաստված մոդելները հասանելի են https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'am': "To avoid the 'meaning conflation deficiency' of word embeddings, a number of models have aimed to embed individual word senses.  ይህች ሥርዓቶች በአንድ ጊዜ በንግግር ማሰናከል (WSI) በሚመስል ስራ ላይ መልካም ሆኖ ይደረጋሉ፤ ነገር ግን በተጨማሪው ግንኙነቶች የሚጠቅሙት የስራ መግለጫ ጥያቄዎች ተደርጓል፡፡ ነገር ግን ማወቅ እና ማነጋገል እርስ በርሳቸው የተለየ አይፈልግም፡፡ የፖሊኤልM ስርዓት ለማስተማር ስራትን እንደ ቋንቋ ምሳሌ መግለጫ መሆኑን እናስጠጋለን፡፡ PolyLM የቃላት እውቀት በሚያሳዩ ሁለት ጥያቄዎች ላይ በመሠረት ነው፤ በመጀመሪያ፣ በተሰጠው ክፍል የሚናገር ቃል የግንኙነት የአካላት ስህተት የግንኙነት ክፍል ነው፡፡ በሁለተኛውም፣ አንዱ ከሌሎቹ ይልቅ በአካባቢው ላይ ይደሰታል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን ስድስት እጥፍ ጥቂት ቢኖር የአሁኑ የ-አርእስት ሀብት ግንኙነት አካባቢ ሀብትን እናስተያየዋለን፡፡ Code and pre-trained models are available at https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.", 'az': 'Sözlüklərin "müfəssəl təhlükəsizlik" deməkdən qaçırmaq üçün bir neçə modeli individual söz duygularını daxil etmək niyyətində idi. Bu metodlar bir dəfə, sözlərin sağlam induksyonu kimi yaxşı işlədilər, amma bu təqdirdə müxtəlif inşallarını istifadə edən işlər müəyyən edilən metodlar tələb edilmişdir. Ancaq hiss məlumatları və contextualizasyonları bir-birindən təkrarlanması lazımdır. Biz PolyLM\'i, dil modellik problemi olaraq öyrənmək məlumatının məlumatını formüləyən bir metodu təşkil edirik, müxtəlif metodların istifadə edilməsinə imkan verir. PolyLM söz duyguları barəsindəki iki təsəvvür üzərində dayanılır: ilk dəfə, bəzi duyguları barəsindəki bir söz olaraq gələn mümkünlüyün toplamı eyni ola bilər. İkinci olaraq, bir söz olaraq, onun hisslərindən biri digərlərindən daha münasibdir. Biz WSI-də PolyLM\'i değerləşdiririk ki, bu, əvvəlki hiss içində olan tekniklərdən çox yaxşı işlər edir, altı dəfə daha az parametr olmasına rağmen, art ıq müxtəlif WSI metodlarına uyuşur. Kod və əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş modellər https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'sq': "To avoid the 'meaning conflation deficiency' of word embeddings, a number of models have aimed to embed individual word senses.  Këto metoda në një kohë u kryen mirë në detyra të tilla si induktimi i sensit të fjalës (WSI), por ato janë përfshirë që at ëherë nga teknikat specifike të detyrave që shfrytëzojnë përfshirjet kontekstuale. However, sense embeddings and contextualization need not be mutually exclusive.  Ne prezantojmë PolyLM, një metodë që formulon detyrën e mësimit të kuptimit të përfshirjes si një problem modelimi gjuhësh, duke lejuar aplikimin e teknikave kontekstualizimi. PolyLM bazohet në dy supozime themelore rreth ndjenjave të fjalës: së pari, se probabiliteti i një fjale që ndodh në një kontekst të caktuar është i barabartë me shumën e probabiliteteve të ndjenjave individuale të saj që ndodhin; dhe së dyti, që për një ndodhje të caktuar të një fjale, një nga ndjenjat e saj ka tendencë të jetë shumë më i besueshëm në kontekst se të tjerët. Ne vlerësojmë PolyLM në WSI, duke treguar se ajo funksionon konsiderueshëm më mirë se teknikat e mëparshme të përfshirjes së ndjenjave dhe përputhet me metodën aktuale të specializuar të WSI pavarësisht se ka gjashtë herë më pak parametra. Code and pre-trained models are available at  https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.", 'af': 'Om die "betekening van konflaksieontwikkeligheid" van woord inbettings te verdwyn, \'n aantal modele het bedoel om individuele woord senses te inbeter. Hierdie metodes op een tyd goed uitgevoer het op opdragte soos woord sin induksie (WSI), maar hulle het sedert af oorgetrek deur opdragspesifieke teknike wat contextualiseerde inbêdinge uitbrei. Maar sin inbêding en kontekstualisering moet nie gemeenskaplik eksklusief wees nie. Ons introduseer PolyLM, \'n metode wat die taak van leer sens inbettings as \'n taal modellering probleem formeer, wat toelaat kontekstualisering teknike toe te word. PoliLM is gebaseer op twee ondersteunde aanvaardighede oor woord senses: eerste, dat die waarskynlik van \'n woord wat in \'n gegewe konteks voorkom is gelyk aan die sum van die waarskynlikheite van sy individuele senses wat voorkom; En tweedeel, dat vir \'n gegewe voorkoms van \'n woord, een van sy senses tendeer baie meer in die konteks as die ander te wees. Ons evalueer PolyLM op WSI, wys dat dit beter uitvoer as vorige sens inbetering teknike, en ooreenstem die huidige staat- of- die- kuns spesialiseerde WSI metode, selfs om ses maal minder parameters te hê. Name https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'ca': "To avoid the 'meaning conflation deficiency' of word embeddings, a number of models have aimed to embed individual word senses.  Aquests mètodes s'han executat bé en tasques com l'inducció del sentit de paraules (WSI), però des d'aleshores han estat superats per tècniques específices de tasques que expliquen incorporacions contextualitzades. No obstant això, l'incorporació de sentits i la contextualització no han de ser mutuament exclusives. Introduïm PolyLM, un mètode que formula la tasca d'aprendre integracions de sentits com un problem a de modelació de llenguatges, permetent aplicar tècniques de contextualització. PolyLM es basa en dues suposicions subjacentes sobre sentits de paraula: en primer lloc, que la probabilitat d'una paraula ocurrent en un context determinat és igual a la suma de les probabilitats dels sentits individuals ocurrents; i en segon lloc, que per una aparició determinada d'una paraula, un dels seus sentits tendeix a ser molt més plausible en el context que els altres. Evaluam PolyLM en WSI, mostrant que funciona considerablement millor que tècniques d'incorporació de sentits anteriors, i coincideix amb el mètode WSI especialitzat actualment més avançat malgrat que té sis vegades menys paràmetres. El codi i els models pré-entrenats estan disponibles en https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.", 'bn': 'বিভিন্ন শব্দের মানে কনফিগারেশনের ব্যবস্থা থেকে এড়িয়ে যাওয়ার উদ্দেশ্যে বেশ কয়েকটি মডেল ব্যক্তিগত শব্দের অনুভূতি বা এই পদ্ধতিগুলো একবার ভালো করে যেমন শব্দের মানসিক শিল্প (WSI), কিন্তু কাজের বিশেষ প্রযুক্তি থেকে তাদের পাকড়াও করা হয়েছে যারা প্রতিযোগিত However, sense embeddings and contextualization need not be mutually exclusive.  We introduce PolyLM, a method which formulates the task of learning sense embeddings as a language modeling problem, allowing contextualization techniques to be applied.  পোলিএলএম শব্দের অনুভূতি সম্পর্কে দুটি মূল ধারণার উপর ভিত্তি করেছে: প্রথমত, একটি প্রেক্ষাপটে একটি শব্দের সম্ভাবনা তার ব্যক্তিগত অনুভূতির সমান। এবং দ্বিতীয়, যে একটি বাক্যের ঘটনার জন্য, অন্যদের চেয়ে অন্যতম অনুভূতির মধ্যে একটি অনুভূতি অনেক বেশী বেশী বিদ্রুপ। আমরা WSI-এ পোলিএলএমকে মূল্যায়ন করি, দেখাচ্ছি যে এটা পূর্ববর্তী অনুভূতির চেয়ে বেশি ভালো কাজ করে যাচ্ছে এবং বর্তমান শিল্পের বিশেষ প্রযুক্তিগত বিশেষ প্রযুক কোড এবং পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত মডেলে পাওয়া যাচ্ছে https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'et': 'Selleks et vältida sõnade põimimise tähendusepuudust, on mitmete mudelite eesmärk integreerida üksikud sõnade meeled. Need meetodid toimisid korraga hästi selliste ülesannete puhul nagu sõnameele induktsioon (WSI), kuid sellest ajast on möödunud ülesandespetsiifilised tehnikad, mis kasutavad ära kontekstipõhiseid manustamisi. Siiski ei pea mõtted ja kontekstualiseerimine üksteist välistama. Tutvustame PolyLMi, meetodit, mis sõnastab meelte põimimise ülesande keele modelleerimise probleemina, võimaldades rakendada kontekstualiseerimismeetodeid. PolyLM põhineb kahel aluseks oleval eeldusel sõnameelte kohta: esiteks, et sõna esinemise tõenäosus antud kontekstis on võrdne selle individuaalsete meelte esinemise tõenäosuste summaga; ja teiseks, et teatava sõna esinemise korral kipub üks selle meeltest olema kontekstis palju usutavam kui teised. Me hindame PolyLM-i WSI-l, näidates, et see toimib oluliselt paremini kui varasemad sense embedding tehnikad ja sobib praeguse state-of-the-art spetsialiseeritud WSI meetodiga vaatamata kuus korda vähem parameetreid. Koodi ja eelkoolitud mudelid on saadaval aadressil https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'bs': 'Da bi izbjegao "nedostatak konflikcije" riječi ugrađenja, broj modela je ciljao uključiti pojedinačne osjećaje riječi. Ove metode su u jednom trenutku provedene dobro na zadatkima poput indukcije riječi smisla (WSI), ali su od tada prešle tehnike specifičnih zadataka koje iskorištavaju kontekstualizirane integracije. Međutim, osjećaj ugrađenja i kontekstualizacija ne trebaju biti međusobno ekskluzivan. Predstavljamo PolyLM, metodu koja formulira zadatak učenja osjećaja ugrađenja jezika kao problem modeliranja jezika, omogućavajući primjenu tehnika kontekstualizacije. PolyLM se temelji na dva temeljna pretpostavka o osjećajima riječi: prvo, da je vjerojatnost riječi koja se pojavljuje u određenom kontekstu jednaka sumi vjerojatnosti njegovih pojedinačnih čula koji se pojavljuju; I drugo, da za određenu pojavu riječi, jedna od njegovih čula čini biti mnogo vjerojatnija u kontekstu od drugih. Procjenjujemo PolyLM na WSI, pokazujući da izvodi značajno bolje od prethodnih tehnika ugrađenja osjećaja, i odgovara trenutnom metodu specijaliziranog WSI, uprkos što ima šest puta manje parametara. Kod i predobučeni modeli su dostupni na https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'cs': 'Aby se zabránilo "nedostatku směšování významů" vkládání slov, zaměřila se řada modelů na vkládání jednotlivých slovních smyslů. Tyto metody v jedné době fungovaly dobře u úkolů, jako je indukce slova (WSI), ale od té doby byly předstiženy technikami specifickými pro úkoly, které využívají kontextualizované vložení. Nicméně smyslové vložení a kontextualizace se nemusí vzájemně vylučovat. Představujeme metodu PolyLM, která formuluje úlohu učení smyslových vložení jako problém jazykového modelování a umožňuje aplikaci kontextualizačních technik. PolyLM je založen na dvou základních předpokladech o slovních smyslech: za prvé, že pravděpodobnost, že se slovo vyskytne v daném kontextu, se rovná součtu pravděpodobností jeho jednotlivých smyslů; a za druhé, že pro daný výskyt slova, jeden z jeho smyslů má tendenci být v kontextu mnohem věrohodnější než ostatní. Vyhodnocujeme PolyLM na WSI, což ukazuje, že funguje výrazně lepší než předchozí techniky vkládání smyslů a odpovídá současné nejmodernější specializované metodě WSI i přes šestikrát méně parametrů. Kód a předškolené modely jsou k dispozici na adrese https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'fi': 'Jotta vältettäisiin sanan sulauttamisen merkityksen puute, useat mallit ovat pyrkineet sulauttamaan yksittäisiä sanaaisteja. Nämä menetelmät toimivat aikanaan hyvin esimerkiksi sanaaistin induktiossa (WSI), mutta ne ovat sittemmin ohittaneet tehtäväkohtaiset tekniikat, jotka hyödyntävät kontekstualisoituja upotuksia. Aistien sulauttamisen ja kontekstualisoinnin ei kuitenkaan tarvitse olla toisiaan poissulkevia. Esittelemme PolyLM-menetelmän, joka muotoilee aistiupotustehtävän kielen mallinnusongelmana ja mahdollistaa kontekstualisointitekniikoiden soveltamisen. PolyLM perustuu kahteen sanan aisteja koskevaan oletukseen: ensinnäkin siihen, että sanan esiintymisen todennäköisyys tietyssä kontekstissa on yhtä suuri kuin sen yksittäisten aistien todennäköisyyksien summa; ja toiseksi, että tietyn sanan esiintyminen, yksi sen aisteista taipuu olemaan paljon uskottavampi kontekstissa kuin muut. Arvioimme PolyLM:n WSI:ssä osoittaen, että se toimii huomattavasti paremmin kuin aikaisemmat sense embedding -tekniikat ja vastaa nykyistä huipputekniikkaa erikoistunutta WSI-menetelmää, vaikka sillä on kuusi kertaa vähemmän parametreja. Koodi ja esikoulutetut mallit ovat saatavilla osoitteessa https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'sk': 'Da bi se izognili "pomanjkanju pomena" vključevanja besed, so številni modeli namenjeni vključitvi posameznih besednih čutov. Te metode so se nekoč dobro izvajale pri nalogah, kot je indukcija besednega pomena (WSI), vendar so jih od takrat prehitele tehnike, specifične za opravila, ki izkoriščajo kontekstualizirane vdelave. Vendar pa vključevanje čutov in kontekstualizacija ni treba medsebojno izključevati. Predstavljamo PolyLM, metodo, ki oblikuje nalogo učenja vgradnje čutov kot problem jezikovnega modeliranja in omogoča uporabo tehnik kontekstualizacije. PolyLM temelji na dveh osnovnih predpostavkah o besednih čutih: prvič, da je verjetnost, da se beseda pojavi v danem kontekstu, enaka vsoti verjetnosti, da se pojavijo njeni posamezni čuti; in drugič, da je za določen pojav besede eden od njenih čutov v kontekstu veliko bolj verjeten kot drugi. Ocenjujemo PolyLM na WSI in pokažemo, da je bistveno boljši od prejšnjih tehnik vključevanja senzov in se ujema z najsodobnejšo specializirano WSI metodo kljub šestkrat manj parametrov. Koda in vnaprej usposobljeni modeli so na voljo na spletni strani https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'jv': 'So that\'s the first one Awakdhéwé éntuk sistem sing beraksikno ning tasks iki dadi, nik sekolah luwih (WSI) sing beraksikno, dadi wis digaweh panelok teknik sing beraksikno yang cukup tur angel sing beraksikno politenessoffpolite, "), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé nggawe poliLM, sistem sing sumulakno nggawe seneng sampeyan gambar kelas supaya winih, supoyo iso nggawe teknik contextual (contextual) Multiple Sampeyan tanggal, dadi kanggo kelas kelas nang kelas, siji-siji sak tentang gak penting ing sak kudu supaya sak ning acara sak sabané. Awak dhéwé Layout https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'he': 'כדי להימנע מהחוסר "משמעות קומפליציה" של קישורים מילים, מספר דוגמנים מכוונים לקשור חושים מילים בודדים. שיטות אלה באותו זמן ביצעו היטב במשימות כמו דליקת תחושת מילים (WSI), אך מאז הן הועברו על ידי טכניקות ספציפיות למשימות שמניצלות תוכניות קונטוקטואליזציות. עם זאת, תוכניות תחושה וקונטליזציה לא צריכות להיות בלעדיות אחד לשני. אנחנו מציגים את PolyLM, שיטה שמייצבת את המשימה של לימוד מושג תוכניות כבעיה של דוגמנית שפה, מאפשרת שימוש טכניקות הקונטליזציה. PolyLM מבוסס על שתי הניחויות בסיסיות על חושים מילים: ראשית, שהסבירות של מילה מתרחשת בקשר מסוים שווה לסכום של הסבירות של החושים האישיים שלה מתרחשים; ושנייה, שבמקרה מסוים של מילה, אחד מהחושים שלו נוטה להיות הרבה יותר אמין בקשר מאשר האחרים. אנו מעריכים את PolyLM על WSI, מראים שהוא מבצע הרבה יותר טוב מאשר טכניקות ההכניסה של תחושה קודמות, ומתאים לשיטת WSI המיוחדת המיוחדת הנוכחית למרות שישה פעמים פחות פרמטרים. קוד ודוגמנים מאומנים מראש זמינים ב https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.', 'ha': "Don ka nĩsantar da tsarin kayan faɗin magana wanda aka ƙunsa da shi, wasu misãlai sun yi amfani da in shigar da sauri guda. Waɗannan hanyõyin su a lokacin da aka samar da su mai kyau a kan aikin su kamar kunna mai hankali (WSA), kuma amma sun kãma su da wasu technical masu ƙayyade aikin da ke yin amfani da masu sakanci. A lokacin da, ma'abũcin gaskiyar da za'a ba ta buƙata da ɗayan mutane ba. Tuna ƙara PolyLM, wata metode wanda ke formidar aikin da za'a sanar da shi kamar wata matsayi mai motsi da harshe, kuma yana yarda in zama da'ana wa'azi. PolyLM ne a kan ƙayyade sauri biyu masu ƙaranci game da sanyin magana: farkon, ya yi kusa an faɗi wata magana wanda ke cikin mazaɓa da aka bã shi daidai da suman sautin da ke sami; Da na ƙarshe, cewa wa wani abu ya zo da wata kalma, ɗayansa ya fi zama mai fasahawa a cikin muhimmada ko da ya sauce. Tuna ƙaddara PolyLM a kan WSA, kuma Muke nuna cewa, ta yi mafiya alhẽri daga masu fasihi da aka riga ya haɗi, kuma yana daidai da hanyor-halin-da-sanar da aka ƙayyade WAI, kuma kõ da ya sami parameteri 6 sau kaɗan. Ana iya amfani da kodi da motsalan da aka riga-tune https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.", 'bo': 'འོན་ཀྱང་། གསལ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་གསལ་བཤད་ཆེན་དག་གནོད་པ་ལྟར་བཅས་ཀྱི་མིག་དཔེ་གཏོང་གི་གྲངས་ཀ་ལས་དུས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་སྦྱར་ ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་ཚོ་གཅིག་གཅིག་ནས་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་པ་ལྟར། ཡིན་ནའང་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་ཞུན་དག་བྱེད་དགོས་མེད། ང་ཚོས་PolyLM་ལ་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གསར་གཏོང་བྱེད་མཁན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་སྐད་རིགས་མ་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིག སྔོན་དང་། གནད་དོན་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་ཆེད་ཚོར་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ཐབས་རྩོམ་པ་གཉིས་གཞི་རྟེན་འདུག། དང་པོ་བརྗོད། ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་གི་འབྱུང་རིང་ལ། སེམས་ཚོར་གཅིག་ནི་སྐྱེས་པའི་ནང་དུ་གཞན་པ་ལས་མང་གསལ་བཤད་རྒྱུ་ཞིག་ཡིན། We evaluate PolyLM on WSI, showing that it performs considerably better than previous sense embedding techniques, and matches the current state-of-the-art specialized WSI method despite having six times fewer parameters. སྔོན་གྲངས་ཀྱི་མིག་ཆས་དང་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་པའི་མིག་ཆས་ཡོད་པ https://github.com/AlanAnsell/PolyLM.'}
{'en': 'Cross-lingual Entity Alignment with Incidental Supervision', 'ar': 'توافق الكيان متعدد اللغات مع الإشراف العرضي', 'fr': 'Alignement des entités multilingues avec la supervision fortuite', 'pt': 'Alinhamento de Entidade multilíngue com supervisão incidental', 'es': 'Alineación de la entidad multilingüe con la supervisión incidental', 'ja': 'インシデント監督とのクロスリンガルエンティティの調整', 'ru': 'Выравнивание кросс-лингвистической сущности со случайным надзором', 'zh': '偶然跨语实体齐', 'hi': 'प्रासंगिक पर्यवेक्षण के साथ क्रॉस-भाषी एंटिटी संरेखण', 'ga': 'Aonán Trastheangach Ailíniú le Maoirseacht Theagmhasach', 'el': 'Διασγλωσσική ευθυγράμμιση οντότητας με την περιστασιακή εποπτεία', 'ka': 'სიტყვებულ ელემენტის დაწყვეტილება', 'it': "Allineamento multilingue dell'entità con la supervisione incidentale", 'hu': 'Nyelveken átnyúló szervezetek összehangolása az esetleges felügyelethez', 'kk': 'Тілді бірнеше нысандарды бақылау', 'ms': 'Cross-lingual Entity Alignment with Incidental Supervision', 'lt': 'Tarpkalbinis subjekto suderinimas su incidentine priežiūra', 'mt': 'Allinjament bejn Entitajiet Lingwistiċi mas-Superviżjoni Inċidentali', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്- ലിന്\u200dഗുല്\u200d എന്റിറ്റിയുടെ അനുകൂലമാക്കുക', 'mn': 'Холбоо хэлний бүлгүүдийн тусгаарлалт', 'mk': 'Распоредување на меѓујазичниот ентитет со инцидентна надзора', 'ro': 'Alinierea interlingvă a entității cu supravegherea incidentală', 'sr': 'Kroz-jezički položaj entiteta sa slučajnim nadzorom', 'so': 'Isku xiriirka ganacsiga ee luuqada iskuulka', 'si': 'විශාල භාෂාවක් අන්තිම අන්තිම අන්තිම ප්\u200dරදේශය සමග', 'pl': 'Dostosowanie podmiotów wielojęzycznych do nadzoru incydentalnego', 'no': 'Krysspråk entitetsjustering med innkommande oversikt', 'ur': 'Cross-lingual Entity Alignment with Incidental Supervision', 'ta': 'Cross-lingual Entity Alignment with Incidental Supervision', 'sv': 'Tvärspråkig enhetsanpassning till oavsiktlig tillsyn', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Междуезично подравняване на субектите с инцидентен надзор', 'da': 'Tværsproget enhedstilpasning med hændelsestilsyn', 'nl': 'Meertalige entiteitsafstemming met incidenteel toezicht', 'hr': 'Krozjezično ispravljanje područja s incidentnim nadzorom', 'de': 'Quersprachige Entitätenausrichtung mit Incidental Supervision', 'ko': '다중 언어 실체 조율과 부대 감독', 'fa': 'تنظیمات واحدهای مختلف زبان با نظارت داخلی', 'sw': 'Uunganishaji wa Ujumbe wa lugha yenye lugha', 'tr': 'Gerçek Metini Dolamak', 'sq': 'Ndryshimi ndërgjuhësor i njësisë me mbikqyrjen rastësore', 'af': 'Krysspraak Entiteit Oplyn met Inkidentale Supervisie', 'am': 'undo-type', 'az': '䓉饲条桬쒱⁇쎶穬즙얟摩物汭槅鼠욏污盉餠욏污盉饳椊', 'hy': 'Հավանական վերահսկողության հետ', 'bn': 'দুর্ঘটনার সাপার্ভিশন সহ ক্রস- ভাষায় এন্টিটিমেন্ট', 'id': 'Penjajaran Entitas Selangbahasa dengan Supervisi Incidental', 'ca': 'Aliniament entre entitats translingües i supervisió incidental', 'bs': 'Kroz jezičke spojene entiteta sa slučajnim nadzorom', 'cs': 'Vyrovnání vícejazyčných subjektů s incidentálním dohledem', 'fi': 'Monikielinen yksikkö, joka vastaa satunnaista valvontaa', 'et': 'Keeleülene üksus vastavusse juhusliku järelevalvega', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'sk': 'Večjezična usklajenost subjektov z naključnim nadzorom', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་གཅིག་མཚུངས་པའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱིས་ཕན་ཚོར་ལྟ་བུ་དང་', 'he': 'התאמה בין יחידות שפותיות עם פיקוח צירוף'}
{'en': 'Much research effort has been put to multilingual knowledge graph (KG) embedding methods to address the entity alignment task, which seeks to match entities in different languagespecific KGs that refer to the same real-world object. Such methods are often hindered by the insufficiency of seed alignment provided between KGs. Therefore, we propose a new model, JEANS, which jointly represents multilingual KGs and text corpora in a shared embedding scheme, and seeks to improve entity alignment with incidental supervision signals from text. JEANS first deploys an entity grounding process to combine each KG with the monolingual text corpus. Then, two learning processes are conducted : (i) an embedding learning process to encode the KG and text of each language in one embedding space, and (ii) a self-learning based alignment learning process to iteratively induce the correspondence of entities and that of lexemes between embeddings. Experiments on benchmark datasets show that JEANS leads to promising improvement on entity alignment with incidental supervision, and significantly outperforms state-of-the-art methods that solely rely on internal information of KGs.', 'fr': "De nombreux efforts de recherche ont été consacrés aux méthodes d'intégration de graphes de connaissances multilingues (KG) pour répondre à la tâche d'alignement des entités, qui cherche à faire correspondre des entités dans différents KG spécifiques à une langue qui font référence au même objet du monde réel. De telles méthodes sont souvent entravées par l'insuffisance de l'alignement des semences entre les KG. Par conséquent, nous proposons un nouveau modèle, JEANS, qui représente conjointement les KG multilingues et les corpus textuels dans un schéma d'intégration partagé, et cherche à améliorer l'alignement des entités avec des signaux de supervision accessoires provenant du texte. JEANS déploie d'abord un processus de mise à la terre d'entité pour combiner chaque KG avec le corpus de texte monolingue. Ensuite, deux processus d'apprentissage sont menés\xa0: (i) un processus d'apprentissage par intégration pour coder le KG et le texte de chaque langue dans un espace d'intégration, et (ii) un processus d'apprentissage d'alignement basé sur l'auto-apprentissage pour induire de manière itérative la correspondance des entités et celle des lexèmes entre les intégrations. Des expériences sur des ensembles de données de référence montrent que JEANS conduit à une amélioration prometteuse de l'alignement des entités avec la supervision accessoire, et surpasse de manière significative les méthodes de pointe qui reposent uniquement sur les informations internes des KG.", 'ar': 'تم بذل الكثير من الجهود البحثية لطرق تضمين الرسم البياني المعرفي متعدد اللغات (KG) لمعالجة مهمة محاذاة الكيان ، والتي تسعى إلى مطابقة الكيانات في لغات مختلفة من KGs التي تشير إلى نفس كائن العالم الحقيقي. غالبًا ما يتم إعاقة هذه الأساليب بسبب عدم كفاية محاذاة البذور المتوفرة بين KGs. لذلك ، نقترح نموذجًا جديدًا ، JEANS ، والذي يمثل بشكل مشترك KGs متعدد اللغات والنص corpora في مخطط تضمين مشترك ، ويسعى إلى تحسين محاذاة الكيان مع إشارات الإشراف العرضية من النص. ينشر JEANS أولاً عملية تأريض للكيان لدمج كل KG مع مجموعة النص أحادي اللغة. بعد ذلك ، يتم إجراء عمليتي تعلم: (1) عملية تعلم التضمين لتشفير KG ونص كل لغة في مساحة تضمين واحدة ، و (2) عملية تعلم محاذاة قائمة على التعلم الذاتي للحث بشكل متكرر على مراسلات الكيانات وذلك من lexemes بين الزفاف. تُظهر التجارب على مجموعات البيانات المعيارية أن JEANS تؤدي إلى تحسين واعد في مواءمة الكيانات مع الإشراف العرضي ، وتتفوق بشكل كبير على أحدث الأساليب التي تعتمد فقط على المعلومات الداخلية لـ KGs.', 'pt': 'Muito esforço de pesquisa foi feito para métodos de incorporação de gráficos de conhecimento multilíngue (KG) para abordar a tarefa de alinhamento de entidades, que busca combinar entidades em diferentes KGs específicos de linguagem que se referem ao mesmo objeto do mundo real. Tais métodos são muitas vezes dificultados pela insuficiência de alinhamento de sementes fornecido entre KGs. Portanto, propomos um novo modelo, JEANS , que representa conjuntamente KGs multilíngues e corpora de texto em um esquema de incorporação compartilhada e busca melhorar o alinhamento da entidade com os sinais de supervisão incidentais do texto. O JEANS primeiro implanta um processo de aterramento de entidade para combinar cada KG com o corpus de texto monolíngue. Em seguida, dois processos de aprendizagem são conduzidos: (i) um processo de aprendizagem de incorporação para codificar o KG e o texto de cada idioma em um espaço de incorporação, e (ii) um processo de aprendizagem de alinhamento baseado em autoaprendizagem para induzir iterativamente a correspondência de entidades e que de lexemas entre embeddings. Experimentos em conjuntos de dados de referência mostram que o JEANS leva a uma melhoria promissora no alinhamento da entidade com a supervisão incidental e supera significativamente os métodos de última geração que dependem exclusivamente de informações internas dos KGs.', 'es': 'Se ha dedicado mucho esfuerzo de investigación a los métodos de incorporación de gráficos de conocimiento multilingües (KG) para abordar la tarea de alineación de entidades, que busca hacer coincidir entidades en diferentes KG específicos del idioma que se refieren al mismo objeto del mundo real. Tales métodos a menudo se ven obstaculizados por la insuficiencia de la alineación de semillas proporcionada entre los KG. Por lo tanto, proponemos un nuevo modelo, JEANS, que representa conjuntamente los KG multilingües y los corpus de texto en un esquema de incrustación compartida, y busca mejorar la alineación de la entidad con las señales de supervisión incidentales del texto. JEANS primero implementa un proceso de base de entidades para combinar cada KG con el corpus de texto monolingüe. Luego, se llevan a cabo dos procesos de aprendizaje: (i) un proceso de aprendizaje de incrustación para codificar el KG y el texto de cada idioma en un espacio de inserción, y (ii) un proceso de aprendizaje de alineación basado en el autoaprendizaje para inducir iterativamente la correspondencia de las entidades y la de los lexemas entre las incorporaciones. Los experimentos sobre conjuntos de datos de referencia muestran que JEANS conduce a una mejora prometedora en la alineación de las entidades con la supervisión incidental, y supera significativamente a los métodos de última generación que se basan únicamente en la información interna de los KG.', 'ja': 'エンティティアラインメントタスクに対処するための多言語ナレッジグラフ（ KG ）埋め込み方法には多くの研究努力が投じられている。エンティティアラインメントタスクは、同じ現実世界のオブジェクトを参照する異なる言語固有のKGのエンティティを一致させようとしている。 かかる方法は、しばしば、ＫＧ間に提供されるシードアラインメントの不十分さによって妨げられる。 そこで、共通の埋め込みスキームで多言語KGとテキストコーパスを併用し、テキストからの付随的な監視信号とのエンティティの整合性を向上させようとする新しいモデル「ジーンズ」を提案する。 ジーンズはまず、各KGと単一言語のテキストコーパスを組み合わせるためのエンティティ接地プロセスを展開します。 次に、(i) 1つの埋め込み空間にKGと各言語のテキストをエンコードする埋め込み学習プロセスと、(ii)埋め込み間のエンティティと辞書の対応を反復的に誘導する自己学習ベースのアライメント学習プロセスの2つの学習プロセスが実行される。 ベンチマークデータセットの実験では、ジーンズは付随的な監督とのエンティティアラインメントの改善につながり、KGの内部情報のみに依存する最先端の方法を大幅に上回ることが示されています。', 'zh': '诸治事已投多言知识图谱(KG)嵌入法上,以决实体对齐,该务在匹配不同言语中引用同现实世界特定KG中实体。 常为KG间种不足之限。 因此,我们发出一种新模样,JEANS,在共享嵌方案中共同表示多语言KG和文本语料库,并求改善实体与文本附带监督信号的一致性。 JEANS先设一实接地,以KG与单语文本语料库合。 然后为二学:(i)嵌学,以语言KG文本编码嵌空中,及(ii)学于齐,以迭代诱实体之词素。 其数集之实验,JEANS于附监下一致性有望改进,且显优于仅恃KG内信息之最先进者也。', 'ru': 'Много исследований было приложено к методам встраивания многоязычного графа знаний (KG) для решения задачи выравнивания сущностей, которая направлена на сопоставление сущностей в разных языковых KG, которые относятся к одному и тому же объекту реального мира. Такие способы часто затрудняются недостаточностью выравнивания семян, обеспечиваемого между КГ. Поэтому мы предлагаем новую модель, ДЖИНСЫ , которая совместно представляет многоязычные КГ и текстовые корпуса в общей схеме встраивания и стремится улучшить выравнивание сущности со случайными сигналами наблюдения из текста. ДЖИНСЫ сначала развертывают процесс заземления сущности, чтобы объединить каждый KG с одноязычным текстовым корпусом. Затем проводятся два процесса обучения: (i) процесс обучения встраиванию для кодирования KG и текста каждого языка в одном пространстве вложений и (ii) процесс обучения выравниванию на основе самообучения для итеративного индукции соответствия сущностей и лексем между вложениями. Эксперименты с эталонными наборами данных показывают, что ДЖИНСЫ приводят к многообещающему улучшению выравнивания сущностей при случайном надзоре и значительно превосходят современные методы, которые опираются исключительно на внутреннюю информацию КГ.', 'hi': 'इकाई संरेखण कार्य को संबोधित करने के लिए बहुभाषी ज्ञान ग्राफ (केजी) एम्बेडिंग विधियों के लिए बहुत शोध प्रयास किए गए हैं, जो विभिन्न भाषाओं में संस्थाओं से मेल खाने का प्रयास करता है विशिष्ट केजी जो एक ही वास्तविक दुनिया की वस्तु को संदर्भित करते हैं। इस तरह के तरीकों को अक्सर केजी के बीच प्रदान किए गए बीज संरेखण की अपर्याप्तता से बाधित किया जाता है। इसलिए, हम एक नए मॉडल, जीन्स का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो संयुक्त रूप से एक साझा एम्बेडिंग योजना में बहुभाषी केजी और टेक्स्ट कार्पोरा का प्रतिनिधित्व करता है, और पाठ से आकस्मिक पर्यवेक्षण संकेतों के साथ इकाई संरेखण में सुधार करना चाहता है। जीन्स पहले मोनोलिंगुअल टेक्स्ट कॉर्पस के साथ प्रत्येक केजी को संयोजित करने के लिए एक इकाई ग्राउंडिंग प्रक्रिया को तैनात करता है। फिर, दो सीखने की प्रक्रियाएं आयोजित की जाती हैं: (i) एक एम्बेडिंग स्पेस में प्रत्येक भाषा के केजी और टेक्स्ट को एन्कोड करने के लिए एक एम्बेडिंग लर्निंग प्रक्रिया, और (ii) एक स्व-सीखने आधारित संरेखण सीखने की प्रक्रिया को पुनरावृत्ति से प्रेरित करने के लिए संस्थाओं के पत्राचार और एम्बेडिंग के बीच लेक्सेम्स के लिए। बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि जीन्स आकस्मिक पर्यवेक्षण के साथ इकाई संरेखण पर आशाजनक सुधार की ओर जाता है, और महत्वपूर्ण रूप से अत्याधुनिक तरीकों से बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है जो पूरी तरह से केजी की आंतरिक जानकारी पर भरोसा करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Tá an-iarracht taighde déanta ar mhodhanna leabú graf eolais ilteangach (KG) chun dul i ngleic leis an tasc ailíniú aonáin, a fhéachann le haonáin a mheaitseáil i KGanna a bhaineann go sonrach le teangacha éagsúla a thagraíonn don réad céanna sa saol fíor. Is minic go gcuirtear bac ar mhodhanna den sórt sin mar gheall ar neamhdhóthanacht ailíniú síolta a sholáthraítear idir KGanna. Dá bhrí sin, molaimid múnla nua, JEANS , a dhéanann comhionadaíocht ar KGanna ilteangacha agus corpora téacs i scéim leabú comhroinnte, agus a fhéachann le feabhas a chur ar ailíniú aonáin le comharthaí maoirseachta teagmhasaí ón téacs. Cuireann JEANS próiseas forais aonáin i bhfeidhm ar dtús chun gach KG a chomhcheangal leis an gcorpas téacs aonteangach. Ansin, déantar dhá phróiseas foghlama: (i) próiseas foghlama leabaithe chun KG agus téacs gach teanga a ionchódú in aon spás leabaithe amháin, agus (ii) próiseas foghlama ailíniú bunaithe ar fhéinfhoghlaim chun comhfhreagras na n-eintiteas a chothú go atriallach agus go de lexemes idir leabaithe. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar thacair thacair thagarmharcanna go bhfuil feabhsú tuar dóchais inti mar thoradh ar JEANS ar ailíniú eintitis le maoirseacht theagmhasach, agus go sáraíonn sé go suntasach na modhanna úrscothacha atá ag brath go hiomlán ar fhaisnéis inmheánach KGanna.', 'el': 'Πολλές ερευνητικές προσπάθειες έχουν καταβληθεί σε μεθόδους ενσωμάτωσης πολύγλωσσων γραφικών γνώσεων (KG) για την αντιμετώπιση της εργασίας ευθυγράμμισης οντότητας, η οποία επιδιώκει να αντιστοιχίσει οντότητες σε διαφορετικές γλωσσικές ΚG που αναφέρονται στο ίδιο αντικείμενο πραγματικού κόσμου. Τέτοιες μέθοδοι συχνά παρεμποδίζονται από την ανεπάρκεια ευθυγράμμισης σπόρων που παρέχεται μεταξύ των ΚΓ. Ως εκ τούτου, προτείνουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο, το οποίο από κοινού αντιπροσωπεύει πολυγλωσσικά ΚΓ και σώματα κειμένου σε ένα κοινό σύστημα ενσωμάτωσης, και επιδιώκει να βελτιώσει την ευθυγράμμιση της οντότητας με τυχαία σήματα εποπτείας από το κείμενο. Το JEANS αναπτύσσει πρώτα μια διαδικασία γείωσης οντότητας για να συνδυάσει κάθε KG με το μονογλωσσικό σώμα κειμένου. Στη συνέχεια, διεξάγονται δύο μαθησιακές διαδικασίες: (i) μια διαδικασία ενσωμάτωσης μάθησης για να κωδικοποιήσει το ΚΓ και το κείμενο κάθε γλώσσας σε ένα χώρο ενσωμάτωσης, και (ii) μια διαδικασία εκμάθησης ευθυγράμμισης βασισμένη στην αυτομάθηση για να προκαλέσει επαναληπτικά την αντιστοιχία των οντοτήτων και εκείνων των λεξέμων μεταξύ ενσωμάτωσης. Τα πειράματα σε σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς δείχνουν ότι το JEANS οδηγεί σε ελπιδοφόρα βελτίωση της ευθυγράμμισης της οντότητας με την περιστασιακή εποπτεία και ξεπερνά σημαντικά τις σύγχρονες μεθόδους που βασίζονται αποκλειστικά στις εσωτερικές πληροφορίες των ΚG.', 'ka': 'მრავალენგური მეცნიერების გრაფიკში (KG) ბევრი გასწავლა განსხვავებული ინტერტიკური განსხვავებული ენგების განსხვავებული KGs, რომლებიც იგივე რეალური მსოფლიოს ობიექტის შესახებ. ასეთი მეტოვები ბევრად KGs-ის შორის მხარდაჭერების უფრო დაკავშირება. ამიტომ, ჩვენ ახალი მოდელს, JEANS, რომელიც ერთად მრავალენგური KGs და ტექსტის კოპორაციაში გაყოფილი სქემიდან დავიწყებთ, და სურებთ ტექსტიდან ინტექსტიულ მონაცემის სიგნალთან ინტექსტიულ და JEANS პირველად განსაზღვრებული ინტერტიკური პროცესის გამოყენება, რომ ყველა KG-ს მონოლენგური ტექსტიკური კორპუსთან შემყენებს. შემდეგ ორი სწავლის პროცესები გავაკეთება: i) ყველა ენის KG და ტექსტის კოდირება ერთი კოდირებული სივრცეში, და ii) თავისწავლის განმავლობის განმავლობის პროცესი, რომელიც განმავლობის კონპორციენტის და ლექსის კოდირებენტის კოდი ბანქმარკის მონაცემების გამოცდილებები აჩვენებენ, რომ JEANS გვეუბნება განსაზღვრებას ინტერნეტიკური მონაცემების შესაძლებლობა და მნიშვნელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელ', 'hu': 'Sok kutatási erőfeszítést tettek a többnyelvű tudásgraf (KG) beágyazási módszerekre az entitás igazítási feladat kezelésére, amely különböző nyelvspecifikus KK-k entitásainak összehangolására törekszik, amelyek ugyanarra a valós objektumra utalnak. Az ilyen módszereket gyakran akadályozza a KG-k közötti vetőmagbeállítás hiányossága. Ezért javaslatot teszünk egy új modellt, a JEANS-t , amely együttesen képviseli a többnyelvű KG-ket és a szöveges corporákat egy megosztott beágyazási rendszerben, és arra törekszik, hogy javítsa az entitások igazítását a szövegből származó esetleges felügyeleti jelekkel. A JEANS először egy entitásfeldolgozási folyamatot alkalmaz, amelynek segítségével az egynyelvű szövegkorpuszt kombinálja. Ezután két tanulási folyamatot végeznek: (i) egy beágyazott tanulási folyamat az egyes nyelvek KG és szövegének kódolására egy beágyazási térbe, és (ii) egy öntanuló alapú igazítási tanulási folyamat, amely iteratívan indukálja az entitások és a lexemek korresponenciáját beágyazások között. A referenciaadatkészletekkel végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a JEANS ígéretes javulást eredményez a vállalkozások esetleges felügyelet mellett történő összehangolásában, és jelentősen felülmúlja a legkorszerűbb módszereket, amelyek kizárólag a KG-k belső információira támaszkodnak.', 'kk': 'Көп зерттеу әрекеттері білім графикасына (KG) ендіру әдістеріне қатынау үшін бірнеше тілдер тілдеріне сәйкес келеді. Бұл бір әлемдік нысанға сәйкес келетін KG тілдеріне сәйкес келеді. Бұл әдістерді KG арасында келтірілген тарату тәртібі жеткілікті болмайды. Сондықтан, біз жаңа үлгі, JEANS дегенді таңдаймыз. Бірнеше тілді KGs мен мәтін корпорасын бөліктірілген ендіру сұлбасында көрсетеді, және мәтіннен көп тілді бақылау сигналдарының біріктірімін жақсарт JEANS біріншіден, әрбір KG- ді монолингі мәтін корпус менен біріктіру үшін нысандарды негіздеу процесін орындайды. Содан кейін екі үйрену процесі орындалады: i) әрбір тілдің KG және мәтінін бір ендіру орында кодтау үшін ендіру процесі, және ii) өз оқытуға негізделген тәртіптерді үйрену процесі, қайталау үшін бірліктерді және ендіру арасындағы лексемдерді Деректер бағдарламаларының тәжірибесі, ЖЕОН бағдарламаларының жақсартылығын жақсартуға болады, және KG ішкі мәліметіне тәуелсіз деген өзгерту әдістерінің күйінің әдістерін жасайды.', 'it': "Molto sforzo di ricerca è stato fatto per incorporare metodi multilingue knowledge graph (KG) per affrontare il compito di allineamento delle entità, che cerca di abbinare entità in KG diversi linguaggi specifici che si riferiscono allo stesso oggetto del mondo reale. Tali metodi sono spesso ostacolati dall'insufficiente allineamento delle sementi fornito tra i KG. Pertanto, proponiamo un nuovo modello, JEANS , che rappresenta congiuntamente KG multilingue e corpora di testo in uno schema di incorporazione condiviso, e cerca di migliorare l'allineamento delle entità con segnali di supervisione incidentali provenienti dal testo. JEANS implementa innanzitutto un processo di messa a terra di entità per combinare ogni KG con il corpus di testo monolingue. Successivamente, vengono condotti due processi di apprendimento: (i) un processo di apprendimento embedding per codificare il KG e il testo di ogni lingua in uno spazio embedding, e (ii) un processo di apprendimento di allineamento basato su auto-apprendimento per indurre iterativamente la corrispondenza delle entità e quella dei lexemi tra embedding. Gli esperimenti su set di dati di benchmark mostrano che JEANS porta a miglioramenti promettenti sull'allineamento delle entità con la supervisione incidentale e supera significativamente i metodi all'avanguardia che si basano esclusivamente sulle informazioni interne dei KG.", 'lt': 'Daugiakalbėje žinių grafikoje (KG) buvo dedama daug mokslinių tyrimų pastangų, kuriose įtraukiami metodai, kuriais siekiama spręsti subjektų suderinimo užduotį, kuria siekiama suderinti subjektus skirtingomis kalbomis konkrečiose KG, kurie remiasi tuo pačiu realaus pasaulio objektu. Tokius metodus dažnai trukdo sėklos suderinimo tarp KG nepakankamumas. Todėl siūlome naują model į, JEANS , kuris bendrai atstovauja daugiakalbiams KG ir teksto korporams bendroje įtraukimo sistemoje ir siekia pagerinti subjektų suderinimą su atsitiktiniais priežiūros signalais iš teksto. JEANS pirmiausia įdiegia subjekto steigimo procesą, kad kiekviena KG būtų sujungta su vienakalbiniu teksto korpusu. Tuomet atliekami du mokymosi procesai: i) mokymosi procesas, skirtas koduoti kiekvienos kalbos KG ir tekstą vienoje įterptoje erdvėje, ir ii) savarankiškai mokomas derinimo mokymosi procesas, skirtas pakartotinai paskatinti subjektų ir lexemų korespondenciją tarp įterptojų. Eksperimentai, susiję su lyginamųjų duomenų rinkiniais, rodo, kad JEANS lemia pažadus gerinti subjektų suderinimą su atsitiktine priežiūra ir gerokai viršija moderniausius metodus, kurie grindžiami tik KG vidaus informacija.', 'mk': 'Многу истражувачки напори беа вложени во мнографскиот граф на знаење (KG) со методи за решавање на задачата за приспособување на ентитетите, која се обидува да се совпаѓа со ентитетите во различни јазици специфични KG кои се однесуваат на истиот реални објект. Таквите методи честопати се попречуваат од недостатокот на приспособување на семето помеѓу КГ. Затоа, ние предложуваме нов модел, ЈЕАНС , кој заедно претставува мултијазични КГ и текст корпора во заедничката схема на вградување, и се обидува да го подобри усогласувањето на ентитетите со инцидентните сигнали за надзор од текстот. ЈЕАНС прво распоредува процес на основа на ентитетите за комбинација на секој КГ со монојазичен текст корпус. Then, two learning processes are conducted: (i) an embedding learning process to encode the KG and text of each language in one embedding space, and (ii) a self-learning based alignment learning process to iteratively induce the correspondence of entities and that of lexemes between embeddings.  Експериментите на базите на податоци покажуваат дека ЈЕАНС води до ветувачки подобрување на усогласувањето на ентитетите со инцидентниот надзор и значително ги надминува најдобрите методи кои се зависат само од внатрешни информации на КГ.', 'mt': 'Sar sforz kbir ta’ riċerka fuq grafika ta’ għarfien multilingwi (KG) li tinkorpora metodi biex tindirizza l-kompitu ta’ allinjament tal-entità, li tfittex li taqbel ma’ entitajiet f’lingwi differenti KGs speċifiċi li jirreferu għall-istess oġġett fid-dinja reali. Tali metodi ta’ spiss huma mxekkla mill-insuffiċjenza tal-allinjament taż-żerriegħa pprovduta bejn KGs. Għalhekk, qed nipproponu mudell ġdid, JEANS , li b’mod konġunt jirrappreżenta KGs multilingwi u text corpora fi skema ta’ inkorporazzjoni kondiviża, u qed ifittxu li jtejbu l-allinjament tal-entità mas-sinjali in ċidentali ta’ superviżjoni mit-test. JEANS l-ewwel juża proċess ta’ bażi ta’ entità biex jikkombina kull KG mat-test korpus monolingwi. Imbagħad, jitwettqu żewġ proċessi ta’ tagħlim: (i) proċess ta’ tagħlim inkorporat biex jikkodifika l-KG u t-test ta’ kull lingwa fi spazju wieħed ta’ inkorporazzjoni, u (ii) proċess ta’ tagħlim ta’ allinjament ibbażat fuq it-tagħlim awtonomu biex jinduċi b’mod iterattiv il-korrispondenza tal-entitajiet u dik tal-lexemes bejn l-inkorporazzjonijiet. L-esperimenti dwar settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ parametri referenzjarji juru li l-JEANS iwassal għal titjib promettenti dwar l-allinjament tal-entità mas-superviżjoni inċidentali, u jwassal b’mod sinifikanti għal metodi avvanzati li jiddependu biss fuq informazzjoni interna tal-KGs.', 'ml': 'ഒരുപാട് ലോകത്തിലെ വസ്തുവിന്റെ ഏകാര്യത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷയിലുള്ള വസ്തുക്കളോട് പൊരുതാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്ന പല ഭാഷയിലുള്ള അറിവ് ഗ്രാഫിലേക്ക്  ഇങ്ങനെ രീതികള്\u200d കെജികള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കിയ വിത്തുകളുടെ അസാധ്യതയില്ലാത്തതാല്\u200d തടഞ്ഞുനിര്\u200dത്തുന അതുകൊണ്ട്, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ മോഡല്\u200d, ജെയാന്\u200dസ്, അത് ഒരുമിച്ച് പല ഭാഷ കെജികളെയും ടെക്സ്കോര്\u200dപ്പോരെയും പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്നു. പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്നുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന ജെയാന്\u200dസ് ആദ്യം ഒരു വസ്തുവിന്\u200dറെ ഗ്രൂണിങ്ങ് പ്രക്രിയയെ പ്രക്രിയയിലേക്ക് കെജിയിലേക്ക് കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കാ പിന്നെ രണ്ടു പഠിക്കുന്ന പ്രക്രിയകള്\u200d നടത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു: (i) ഓരോ ഭാഷയുടെയും പഠിപ്പിന്റെയും എക്സോഡിങ്ങ് സ്പെയിന്\u200dഡ് സ്ഥലത്ത് കൊണ്ട് കെജിയുടെയും പഠിപ്പിന്റെയും പ്രക Experiments on benchmark datasets show that JEANS leads to promising improvement on entity alignment with incidental supervision, and significantly outperforms state-of-the-art methods that solely rely on internal information of KGs.', 'mn': 'Олон хэлний мэдлэг график (KG) дээр олон судалгааны хичээл хийгдсэн. Олон хэлний хэлний нэг жинхэнэ ертөнцийн объектийг холбогдох үйл ажиллагааг зохицуулахын тулд олон төрлийн судалгааны хичээл хийгдсэн. Ийм аргыг KG-ийн хоорондоо өгсөн тарианы тусламжгүй байдлаар зогсоож байна. Тиймээс бид шинэ загвар, JEANS, олон хэл KGs болон текст корпоратыг хуваалцах төлөвлөгөөнд илэрхийлдэг, мөн текстүүдийн тусламжтай нэг загварыг сайжруулахыг хичээдэг. JEANS эхлээд KG бүрийг нэг хэлний текст корпус-тай холбогдохын тулд нэгдсэн байгууллагын процессийг ашигладаг. Дараа нь хоёр суралцах процесс хийгддэг: i) KG болон хэл бүрийн текстийг нэг орон зайд кодлох боломжтой суралцах процесс, ii) өөртөө суралцах суралцах суралцах үйл ажиллагааны үйл ажиллагааны хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой. Сэтгэл сангийн өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын туршилт нь JEANS-ын дотор мэдээлэл дээр ганцхан хамаарч буй орчин зүйлсийг зөвхөн хөгжүүлэх боломжтой болгодог гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Det er sett mange forskningseffort på fleirspråksgrafikk (KG) med innbyggingsmetodar for å handtera oppgåva for innrygging av einingar, som søker å passa med einingar i ulike språk spesifiserte KGs som refererer til det same verkeleg objektet. Desse metodane blir ofte hindra av ikkje tilstrekkeligheten av frøjusteringa tilgjengeleg mellom KG. I tillegg foreslår vi eit ny modell, JEANS, som samanlig representerer fleirspråk KGs og tekstkorpora i eit delt innbyggingsoppsett, og søker å forbetra entitetsjustering med incidentalt overvåkingssignal frå tekst. Name Så vert to læringsprosesser gjennomført: i) ein innbygging læringsprosess for å koda KG og teksten av kvar språk i eit innbyggingsrom, og ii) ein selvlæringsbasert læringsprosess for å gjentakast tilsvarande av einingar og lesar mellom innbygging. Eksperimentar på benchmarkdatasett viser at JEANS fører til å foreslå forbetringa på entitetsjusteringa med incidental overvåking, og utfører betydelig tilstandsmetode for kunsten som berre brukar på interne informasjon om KGs.', 'ms': 'Banyak usaha kajian telah ditempatkan ke graf pengetahuan berbilang bahasa (KG) kaedah penyembelihan untuk mengatasi tugas penyesuaian entiti, yang mencari untuk padankan entiti dalam bahasa-bahasa khusus KG yang rujuk kepada objek dunia nyata yang sama. Kaedah tersebut sering diganggu oleh kekurangan penyesuaian benih yang diberikan antara KG. Oleh itu, kami melamar model baru, JEANS, yang bersama-sama mewakili KG berbilang bahasa dan korpra teks dalam skema penyembedding terkongsi, dan cuba untuk meningkatkan penyesuaian entiti dengan isyarat pengawasan insiden dari teks. JEANS pertama menggunakan proses grounding entiti untuk menggabungkan setiap KG dengan korpus teks monobahasa. Kemudian, dua proses pembelajaran dilakukan: (i) proses pembelajaran memasukkan untuk mengekodkan KG dan teks setiap bahasa dalam satu ruang memasukkan, dan (ii) proses pembelajaran penyesuaian berdasarkan pembelajaran diri untuk menginduksi secara berulang-ulang persamaan entiti dan lesem antara penyesuaian. Eksperimen pada set data benchmark menunjukkan bahawa JEANS membawa kepada peningkatan yang berjanji pada penyesuaian entiti dengan pengawasan insiden, dan secara signifikan melebihi kaedah state-of-the-art yang hanya bergantung pada maklumat dalaman KG.', 'sr': 'Mnogi istraživački napori su stavljeni u grafik multijezičkih znanja (KG) ugrađenih metoda da se riješi zadatak za usklađenje entiteta, koji se trudi da odgovara entitetima u različitim jezicima određenim KG-ima koji se odnose na isti stvarni objekt. Takve metode se često ometaju nedovoljstvom poravnanja semena osigurane između KG-a. Stoga predlažemo novi model, JEANS , koji zajedno predstavlja multijezičke KGs i tekstualne korporacije u zajedničkom programu integracije, i pokušava poboljšati poravnanje entiteta sa incidentalnim signalima nadzora iz teksta. JEANS je prvi put pokrenuo proces osnova entiteta da poveže svaku KG sa monojezičkim tekstskim korpusom. Onda se provede dva procesa učenja: i) proces učenja koji se uključuje za kodiranje KG i teksta svakog jezika u jednom ugrađenom prostoru, i ii) proces učenja koji se temelji na samouučenju određuje kako bi ponovno inducirao korespondencu entitata i leksa između ugrađenja. Eksperimenti na standardnim setima podataka pokazuju da JEANS vodi do obećavajućeg poboljšanja na usklađivanje entiteta sa incidentnom nadzorom, i značajno iznosi nacionalne metode umjetnosti koje se oslanjaju samo na unutrašnje informacije KG-a.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් පරීක්ෂණ සැලසුම් කරලා තියෙන්නේ බොහොම භාෂාවික දන්න ග්\u200dරාෆ් (KG) සම්බන්ධ විධාන විධානය සම්බන්ධ විධානය කරන්න, ඒ වගේම සම්බන මේ විධාන විදියට KGs අතර ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් නැති විදියට ප්\u200dරතිකාර කරනවා. ඉතින්, අපි අළුත් මොඩල් එකක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරනවා, JEANS , ඒක සම්බන්ධ භාෂාත්මක KGs සහ පාළු කොර්පෝරාව සම්බන්ධ පද්ධතියක් වලින් ස Name ඊට පස්සේ, ඉගෙනීම් පරීක්ෂණ දෙකක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා: (i) ඉගෙනීම් පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණයක්, හැම භාෂයෙක්ම KG සහ පරීක්ෂණයක් එක්ක ඇම්බෙන්ඩ් අතර ඇතුළු අතර ඇතු බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට්ටුවේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ JEANS පොරොන්දු වෙනුවෙන් පොරොන්දු වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුව', 'so': 'Jahaado badan oo waxbarasho ah waxaa loo sameeyay maamulka aqoonta luuqadaha kala duduwan (KG) oo ku habboon qaababka ku saabsan maamulka sawirida, kaas oo doonaya inuu ku matcho entities oo ku qoran luuqado kala duduwan KGs oo u jeeda dhamaadka caalamiga ah. Dhaqdooyinkaas inta badan waxaa laga hor jeediyaa waajibaadka isbedelinta abuurka ee ka dhexeeya KGs. Therefore, we propose a new model, JEANS , which jointly represents multilingual KGs and text corpora in a shared embedding scheme, and seeks to improve entity alignment with incidental supervision signals from text.  JEANS marka ugu horeysa wuxuu sameynayaa dhameystirka kooxaha, si uu KG walba ugu soo ururiyo qoraalka afka. Markaas waxaa la sameeyaa laba koorasyo waxbarasho: (i) kooras waxbarasho oo ku qoran karta qoraalka KG iyo qoraalka luuqad kasta oo isku meel ah, iyo (ii) xiliga waxbarashada iskuul dhigashada iskuulka ah oo si rasmi ah u bedela dhamaanshaha iyo xuquuqda midibka ah. Imtixaan ku saabsan taariikhda bangiga waxay muuqataa in JEANS uu ku hoggaamiyo hagaajinta suurtagalka shaqaalaha, wuxuuna si muhiim ah u sameeyaa hababka farshaxanka oo keliya ku talo saarta macluumaadka gudaha ee KGs.', 'sv': 'Mycket forskningsarbete har lagts på flerspråkig kunskapsgraf (KG) inbäddande metoder för att hantera entitetsjusteringsuppgiften, som syftar till att matcha entiteter i olika språkspecifika KK som hänvisar till samma verkliga objekt. Sådana metoder hindras ofta av bristande utsädesanpassning mellan KG. Därför föreslår vi en ny modell, JEANS , som tillsammans representerar flerspråkiga KG och textcorpora i ett gemensamt inbäddningssystem, och syftar till att förbättra enhetens anpassning med tillfälliga övervakningssignaler från text. JEANS använder först en enhetsjordningsprocess för att kombinera varje KG med den enspråkiga textkorpusen. Därefter genomförs två inlärningsprocesser: (i) en inbäddad inlärningsprocess för att koda KG och text för varje språk i ett inbäddat utrymme, och (ii) en självlärande baserad anpassnings inlärningsprocess för att iterativt inducera korrespondens mellan entiteter och lexemes mellan inbäddningar. Experiment på benchmarkdatauppsättningar visar att JEANS leder till lovande förbättring av enhetsanpassningen med tillfällig tillsyn och avsevärt överträffar toppmoderna metoder som enbart bygger på intern information om KG.', 'pl': 'Wiele wysiłków badawczych zostało włożone w metody osadzania wielojęzycznego wykresu wiedzy (KG), które mają na celu dopasowanie podmiotów w różnych językowych KG, które odnoszą się do tego samego obiektu świata rzeczywistego. Metody takie są często utrudnione niedostatecznym dostosowaniem nasion zapewnianym między KG. W związku z tym proponujemy nowy model JEANS, który wspólnie reprezentuje wielojęzyczne KG i korpusy tekstowe we wspólnym schemacie osadzania i ma na celu poprawę dostosowania podmiotów do przypadkowych sygnałów nadzoru z tekstu. JEANS najpierw wdraża proces uziemienia podmiotów, aby połączyć każdy KG z jednojęzycznym korpusem tekstowym. Następnie przeprowadzane są dwa procesy uczenia się: (i) proces uczenia się osadzenia w celu zakodowania KG i tekstu każdego języka w jednej przestrzeni osadzenia oraz (ii) proces uczenia się ustawień oparty na samouczeniu się, aby iteracyjnie indukować korespondencję podmiotów i leksemów między osadzeniami. Eksperymenty na zbiorach danych referencyjnych pokazują, że JEANS prowadzi do obiecującej poprawy dostosowania podmiotów z nadzorem przypadkowym i znacznie przewyższa najnowocześniejsze metody, które opierają się wyłącznie na informacjach wewnętrznych KG.', 'ta': 'பல மொழி அறிவிப்பு வரைபடம் (KG) உள்ளிடும் முறைமைகளில் பெரும்பாலான ஆராய்ச்சி முயற்சி செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது, பொருள் ஒழுங்குபடுத்தல் செயலை முறைகளை முயற்சிக் இவ்வாறு முறைகள் KGs இடையில் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட வரிசை ஒழுங்குபடுத்தலின் தேவையில் தடுக்கப்படுகிறது. எனவே, நாங்கள் ஒரு புதிய மாதிரி ஜெயான்ஸ், அது ஒன்றாக பல மொழி கேஜிகள் மற்றும் உரை நிறுவனத்தை குறிப்பிடுகிறது, பகிர்ந்து கொள்ளும் திட்டத்தில் மற்றும் உரையிலி ஜெயான்ஸ் முதலில் ஒரு பொருள் குழுவின் செயலை கைவிடும் ஒவ்வொரு கேஜியையும் மோனோலில்லிங் உரை குறியீடுகளுடன் ஒன பின்னர், இரண்டு கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் செயல்கள் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்டது: (i) ஒவ்வொரு மொழியினும் குறியீட்டில் உள்ள இடைவெளியில் KG மற்றும் உரையைக் குறியிடுவதற்கான ஒரு உள்ளமைப்பு கற்றுக்கொள் Experiments on benchmark datasets show that JEANS leads to promising improvement on entity alignment with incidental supervision, and significantly outperforms state-of-the-art methods that solely rely on internal information of KGs.', 'ur': 'بہت سی تحقیقات کی کوشش کئی زبان علم گراف (KG) میں ڈال دی گئی ہے کہ انٹیٹیٹ کی تعمیر کی کوشش کریں، جو مختلف زبانوں میں متفاوت کرنے کی کوشش کرتی ہے جو ایک ہی حقیقی دنیا کی objektu کی طرف متفاوت کرتی ہیں۔ یہ طریقے اغلب کجی کے درمیان کھیتی سیلامتری کی کمی سے روکتے ہیں. لہٰذا، ہم نے ایک نوی مدل پیشنهاد کرتا ہے، JEANS، جو ایک ساتھ multilingual KGs اور text corpora کو ایک شریک انڈینگ سیکھ میں معرفی کرتا ہے، اور ایک ایستی سیگنال کے ساتھ متوجہ ہونے کی تلاش کرتا ہے. JEANS پہلی بار ایک ایٹینٹ گرانڈنگ پرسس کو ڈال دیتا ہے کہ ہر KG کو ایک زبان تک ٹیکس کورپوس کے ساتھ جمع کرے۔ اس کے بعد، دو سیکھنے کی پروسس عمل کی جاتی ہیں: i) ہر زبان کی KG اور متن کو ایک انڈینگ جگہ میں کوڈ کرنا اور ii) ایک خود سیکھنے کی بنیادی سیکھنے کی پروسس کی تعلیم کی پیدائش کی پیدائش کی پیدائش کرتی ہے کہ تکرارٹی کے ساتھ اتنی چیزوں کی پیدائش اور انڈینگ کے درمیان لکس کرے۔ بنچم مارک ڈاٹ سٹ کے تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ JEANS نے اتنی تحقیق کے ساتھ اتنی سیدھی تحقیق کا وعدہ کیا ہے اور ان کی حالت کی آرتی طریقے سے بہت زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے جو صرف KGs کے داخلی معلومات پر اعتماد رکھتے ہیں.', 'ro': 'Mult efort de cercetare a fost depus pentru metode de integrare multilingvă a graficului cunoștințelor (KG) pentru a aborda sarcina de aliniere a entităților, care caută să potrivească entități în diferite limbi specifice KG care se referă la același obiect din lumea reală. Astfel de metode sunt adesea împiedicate de insuficiența alinierii semințelor furnizate între KG. Prin urmare, propunem un nou model, JEANS , care reprezintă împreună KG-uri multilingve și corpore text într-o schemă de încorporare partajată și urmărește să îmbunătățească alinierea entităților cu semnalele de supraveghere incidentală din text. JEANS implementează mai întâi un proces de împământare a entităților pentru a combina fiecare KG cu corpul text monolingv. Apoi, se desfășoară două procese de învățare: (i) un proces de învățare integrat pentru a codifica KG și textul fiecărei limbi într-un spațiu de încorporare și (ii) un proces de învățare bazat pe auto-învățare de aliniere pentru a induce iterativ corespondența entităților și cea a lexemelor între încorporare. Experimentele efectuate pe seturi de date de referință arată că JEANS duce la îmbunătățiri promițătoare în ceea ce privește alinierea entităților cu supravegherea incidentală și depășește în mod semnificativ metodele de ultimă generație care se bazează exclusiv pe informațiile interne ale KG-urilor.', 'uz': "Name Name Шундай қилиб, biz bir necha tillar KGs va matn kompaniyalarini birlashtirish imkoniyatini ajratish uchun yangi modelni rivojlanamiz va matnning bir xil muvaffaqiyatlaridan tasdiqlashni istaysiz. Name Then, two learning processes are conducted: (i) an embedding learning process to encode the KG and text of each language in one embedding space, and (ii) a self-learning based alignment learning process to iteratively induce the correspondence of entities and that of lexemes between embeddings.  Benchmark maʼlumotlar bazasining imtiyozlari, JEANS hodisa taʼminlovchi soʻzni tasdiqlashga ishonch hosil qiladi, va faqat KGs' indha maʼlumotga ishlatadigan holatning holatini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Đã đặt rất nhiều nỗ lực nghiên cứu vào đồ thị kiến thức đa dạng (KG) để giải quyết nhiệm vụ sắp xếp thực thể, nhằm phù hợp với thực thể trong các tập đoàn đặc biệt về ngôn ngữ khác nhau về những mục này. Những phương pháp như vậy thường gây cản trở bởi việc sắp xếp hạt giống giữa KG thiếu sót. Do đó, chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình mới, JEON, và cùng đại diện cho KG đa dạng và Cơ thể văn bản trong một kế hoạch chia sẻ, và tìm cách cải thiện khả năng hợp nhất với các tín hiệu giám sát ngẫu nhiên từ văn bản. Trác Nhất Hàng triển khai sẽ một quy trình cơ bằng đầu gối của một quy trình gối nhập cho một KG với hộp Cơ thế mỗi. Sau đó, hai tiến trình học được tiến hành: i) một tiến trình học thêm để mã hóa KG và chữ của mỗi ngôn ngữ trong một khoảng lắp ghép, và (II) một tiến trình học tập kết hợp dựa trên tự học để thu hồi các thực thể theo một cách lặp đi lặp lại khả năng tương ứng của các thực thể và ngôn ngữ. Các thí nghiệm trên các bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn cho thấy rằng JEON dẫn đến một cải thiện hứa hẹn trên việc phối hợp với các tổ chức giám sát ngẫu nhiên, và hoàn to àn vượt trội hơn những phương pháp hiện đại chỉ dựa trên nội thông của KG.', 'bg': 'Много изследователски усилия са вложени в многоезичната графика на знанието (КГ) за вграждане на методи за справяне със задачата за подравняване на субектите, която се стреми да съответства на субекти в различни езици специфични КГ, които се отнасят до един и същ обект от реалния свят. Такива методи често са възпрепятствани от недостатъчното изравняване на семената между КГ. Ето защо предлагаме нов модел, който съвместно представлява многоезичните КГ и текстови корпуси в споделена схема за вграждане и се стреми да подобри съответствието на субектите с случайни сигнали за надзор от текста. Първо въвежда процес на заземяване на обекти, за да комбинира всеки КГ с едноезичния текстов корпус. След това се провеждат два учебни процеса: (i) вграден процес на обучение за кодиране на КГ и текста на всеки език в едно вградено пространство, и (ii) самообучение базиран процес на обучение за подреждане, за итеративно индуциране на кореспонденцията на същностите и тази на лексемите между вградените. Експериментите с базови набори от данни показват, че JEANS води до обещаващо подобрение в привеждането на субектите в съответствие с случайния надзор и значително надминава най-съвременните методи, които разчитат единствено на вътрешна информация на КГ.', 'hr': 'Mnogi istraživački napori stavljeni su na multijezički grafik znanja (KG) ugrađene metode za rješavanje zadatka usklađivanja entiteta, koji se trudi odgovarati entitetima u različitim jezicima određenim KG-ima koji se odnose na isti stvarni objekt. Takve metode često sprječavaju nedovoljstvom poravnanja sjemena osigurane između KG-a. Stoga predlažemo novi model, JEANS , koji zajedno predstavlja višejezičke KGs i tekstualne korporacije u zajedničkom programu integracije i pokušava poboljšati usklađenje subjekta sa slučajnim signalima nadzora iz teksta. JEANS prvi put raspoređuje proces osnova entiteta kako bi se svaki KG kombinirao sa monojezičkim tekstskim korpusom. Onda se provodi dva procesa učenja: i) proces učenja ugrađenog za kodiranje KG i teksta svakog jezika u jednom ugrađenom prostoru, i ii) proces učenja koji se temelji na samouučenju usklađivanja kako bi iterativno inducirao dopisnost entiteta i leksa između ugrađenja. Eksperimenti na standardnim podacima pokazuju da JEANS vodi do obećavajućeg poboljšanja poravnanja entiteta s incidentnom nadzorom i značajno iznosi metode stanja umjetnosti koje se oslanjaju samo na unutrašnje informacije o KG-ima.', 'nl': "Er is veel onderzoek gedaan naar meertalige kennisgrafiek (KG) embedmethoden om de entiteitsuitlijningstaak aan te pakken, die ernaar streeft entiteiten in verschillende taalspecifieke KG's te matchen die verwijzen naar hetzelfde real-world object. Dergelijke methoden worden vaak belemmerd door de onvoldoende afstemming van zaad tussen KG's. Daarom stellen we een nieuw model voor, JEANS, dat gezamenlijk meertalige KG's en tekstcorpora vertegenwoordigt in een gedeeld embedding schema, en streeft naar een betere afstemming van entiteiten met incidentele supervisie signalen uit tekst. JEANS zet eerst een entity grounding proces in om elke KG te combineren met het eentalige tekstcorpus. Vervolgens worden twee leerprocessen uitgevoerd: (i) een inbedding leerproces om de KG en tekst van elke taal in één inbedding ruimte te coderen, en (ii) een zelflerend alignment leerproces om iteratief de correspondentie van entiteiten en die van lexemen tussen inbeddingen te induceren. Experimenten met benchmark datasets tonen aan dat JEANS leidt tot veelbelovende verbetering van entiteitsafstemming met incidenteel toezicht, en aanzienlijk beter presteert dan state-of-the-art methoden die uitsluitend gebaseerd zijn op interne informatie van KG's.", 'da': "Meget forskningsindsats er blevet lagt på flersprogede vidensgrafer (KG) indlejringsmetoder til at løse entitetsjusteringsopgaven, som søger at matche enheder i forskellige sprogspecifikke KG'er, der refererer til det samme virkelige objekt. Sådanne metoder hæmmes ofte af utilstrækkelig frøjustering mellem KG'er. Derfor foreslår vi en ny model, JEANS , som i fællesskab repræsenterer flersprogede KG'er og tekstkorpora i en fælles indlejringsordning og søger at forbedre enhedsjusteringen med tilfældige tilsynssignaler fra tekst. JEANS anvender først en enhedsjordningsproces til at kombinere hver KG med det ensprogede tekstkorpus. Derefter udføres to læringsprocesser: (i) en integrerende læringsproces til at kode KG og tekst for hvert sprog i ét indlejringsrum, og (ii) en selvlæringsbaseret tilpasning læringsproces til iterativt at inducere korrespondance mellem enheder og lexemes mellem indlejringer. Eksperimenter med benchmarkdatasæt viser, at JEANS fører til lovende forbedringer af virksomhedernes tilpasning med tilfældigt tilsyn og overgår væsentligt de nyeste metoder, der udelukkende er baseret på interne oplysninger om KG'er.", 'de': 'Viele Forschungsanstrengungen wurden in mehrsprachige Wissensgraphen (KG) Einbettungsmethoden investiert, um die Entitätenausrichtungsaufgabe anzugehen, die versucht, Entitäten in verschiedenen sprachspezifischen KGs abzugleichen, die sich auf dasselbe reale Objekt beziehen. Solche Methoden werden oft durch die unzureichende Saatgutausrichtung zwischen KGs behindert. Daher schlagen wir ein neues Modell vor, JEANS, das gemeinsam mehrsprachige KGs und Textkorpora in einem gemeinsamen Einbettungsschema repräsentiert und versucht, die Entitätenausrichtung mit zufälligen Überwachungssignalen aus Text zu verbessern. JEANS setzt zunächst einen Entity Grounding Prozess ein, um jede KG mit dem einsprachigen Textkorpus zu kombinieren. Anschließend werden zwei Lernprozesse durchgeführt: (i) ein Einbettungs-Lernprozess, um KG und Text jeder Sprache in einem Einbettungsraum zu kodieren, und (ii) ein selbstlernender Alignment-Lernprozess, um iterativ die Korrespondenz von Entitäten und Lexemen zwischen Einbettungen zu induzieren. Experimente mit Benchmark-Datensätzen zeigen, dass JEANS zu einer vielversprechenden Verbesserung der Ausrichtung von Unternehmen mit zufälliger Aufsicht führt und moderne Methoden, die ausschließlich auf internen Informationen von KGs beruhen, deutlich übertrifft.', 'id': 'Banyak usaha penelitian telah ditempatkan pada grafik pengetahuan berbagai bahasa (KG) metode untuk mengatasi tugas penyesuaian entitas, yang berusaha untuk cocok entitas dalam bahasa-bahasa khusus KG yang merujuk kepada objek dunia nyata yang sama. Metode tersebut sering dicegah oleh kekurangan penyesuaian benih yang diberikan antara KG. Oleh karena itu, kami mengusulkan model baru, JEANS, yang bersama-sama mewakili KG berbagai bahasa dan korpora teks dalam skema penyembedding berbagi, dan berusaha untuk meningkatkan penyesuaian entitas dengan sinyal pengawasan insidental dari teks. JEANS pertama-tama menggunakan proses grounding entitas untuk menggabungkan setiap KG dengan corpus teks monobahasa. Kemudian, dua proses pembelajaran dilakukan: (i) proses pembelajaran memasukkan untuk mengekodikan KG dan teks setiap bahasa dalam satu ruang memasukkan, dan (ii) proses pembelajaran berbasis pembelajaran diri untuk menginduksi secara iteratif korespondensi dari entitas dan lexem antara pembelajaran. Eksperimen pada set data benchmark menunjukkan bahwa JEANS memimpin untuk meningkatkan kesesuaian entitas dengan pengawasan insiden, dan secara signifikan melebihi metode state-of-the-art yang hanya bergantung pada informasi internal KG.', 'ko': '실체 정렬 임무를 해결하기 위해 사람들은 다중 언어 지식도(KG) 삽입 방법에 대해 대량의 연구를 진행했다. 이 방법은 서로 다른 언어의 특정한 KG의 실체와 일치하려고 하는데 이런 KG는 같은 실제 세계의 대상을 가리킨다.이런 방법은 종종 KG 간에 제공된 피드의 배열이 부족해서 저항을 받는다.따라서 우리는 새로운 모델인 JEANS를 제시했다. JEANS는 공유 삽입 방안에서 다중 언어인 KG와 텍스트 자료 라이브러리를 연합하여 표시하고 텍스트에 첨부된 감독 신호를 통해 실체의 정렬을 개선하고자 한다.JEANS는 먼저 모든 KG와 단어 텍스트 자료 라이브러리를 결합시키는 실체적 기초 과정을 배치했다.그리고 두 가지 학습 과정을 진행했다. (i) 삽입 학습 과정은 하나의 삽입 공간에서 각 언어의 KG와 텍스트를 인코딩한다. (ii) 자체 학습의 정렬 학습 과정을 바탕으로 삽입 사이의 실체와 어소의 대응을 교체적으로 유도한다.기준 데이터 세트에서의 실험에 의하면 JEANS는 부수적인 감독을 하는 상황에서 실체 정렬에 큰 개선이 있었고 KG 내부 정보에만 의존하는 최신 방법보다 현저히 우수했다.', 'sw': 'Jitihada nyingi za utafiti imewekwa kwenye ramani ya maarifa ya lugha mbalimbali (KG) zilizowekwa katika njia za kuzungumzia kazi ya jukumu la kujitengeneza, ambalo linalenga kupambana na vifaa vingi katika lugha tofauti na KGs zinazomaanisha kitu hicho kinachofanana na kihalisi cha dunia. Hatua hizo mara nyingi huzuiwa na kutokuwepo kwa usawa wa uzazi unaofanywa kati ya KGs. Kwa hiyo, tunapendekeza mtindo mpya, JEANS , ambao kwa pamoja inawakilisha KGs na kampuni ya simu za mkononi katika mpango wa kompyuta unaoendelea, na tunalenga kuboresha uhalisia kwa alama za ufuatiliaji wa matukio kutoka kwenye ujumbe wa maandishi. JEANS kwanza anatumia mchakato wa kikundi cha kuunganisha kila KG kwa kutumia viungo vya maneno ya lugha. Kisha, michakato miwili ya kujifunza yanafanyika: (i) mchakato wa kujifunza unaoendelea kutangaza KG na maandishi ya kila lugha katika nafasi moja, na (ii) mchakato wa kujifunza kwa ajili ya kujifunza kwa ubora wa kujifunza unawezesha makubaliano ya vifaa na vifaa vya vifaa kati ya makampuni. Majaribio kwenye taarifa za bendera zinaonyesha kuwa JEANS inapelekea kutarajiwa kuboreshwa kwa ajili ya uangalizi wa vyombo vya habari na kufuatiliwa kwa matukio, na kwa kiasi kikubwa kinafanya mbinu za aina za sanaa ambazo hutegemea taarifa za ndani ya KGs.', 'fa': 'تلاش زیادی تحقیقات در گراف دانش\u200cهای زیادی زبان (KG) برای حل کردن کار تطبیق\u200cسازی entities قرار داده شده است که تلاش می\u200cکند با entities in different languages specific KGs that refer to the same object in the real world. این روش\u200cها اغلب توسط ناکافی تنظیم دانه\u200cها بین KGs تحت تاثیر قرار می\u200cگیرند. بنابراین، ما یک مدل جدید را پیشنهاد می کنیم، JEANS، که همراه KGs multilingual and text corpora in a shared embedding scheme represents and seeks to improve entity alignment with incidental supervision signals from text. JEANS اولین بار یک فرایند پایه\u200cسازی برای ترکیب هر KG با یک متن تک زبان استفاده می\u200cکند. سپس، دو فرایند یادگیری انجام می\u200cشود: i) یک فرایند یادگیری پیدا می\u200cکند تا KG و متن هر زبان را در یک فضا پیدا کند، و ii) یک فرایند یادگیری بر پایه خود یادگیری برای تکرار کردن تعامل متقابلیت متقابلیت متقابلیت متقابلیت متقابلیت متقابلیت متقابلیت متقابلیت و متقابلیت بین پیدا کردن تجربه\u200cهایی روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای سنجیر نشان می\u200cدهند که JEANS به بهترین قول\u200cدهنده\u200cای در مورد تنظیم کردن اجتماعی با نظارت اتفاقی رخ می\u200cدهد، و به طور کلی روش\u200cهای حالت هنری که تنها بر اطلاعات داخلی KGs اعتماد می\u200cکند، بیشتر از آن انجام می', 'af': "Baie ondersoek versoek is geplaas na veelvuldige kennis graf (KG) inbêring metodes na adres van die entiteit belyning taak, wat soek na ooreenstem entiteite in verskillende langse spesifieke Kgs wat verwys na dieselfde regte wêreld voorwerp. Soos metodes word dikwels verhinder deur die onvoldoensigheid van saad oplyn wat tussen Kg verskaf word. Daarom, ons voorstel 'n nuwe model, JEANS , wat saamstig verskyn multitaalske KG en teks korpora in 'n gedeelte inbêding skema, en soek om entiteite belyning te verbeter met inkidensiele supervisie signale van teks. Constellation name (optional) Dan word twee leer prosesse gedoen: (i) â\x80\x99n inbêring leer proses om die Kg en teks van elke taal in een inbêring spasie te kodeer, en (ii) â\x80\x99n selflêer gebaseerde belyning leer proses om iteratief die ooreenkomstigheid van entiteite en wat van lexems tussen inbêring te bring. Eksperimente op benchmark datastelle vertoon dat JEANS lei na belofte verbetering op entiteitalignment met inkidentale supervisie, en betekenlik uitvoer staat- of- die- kuns- metodes wat slegs op interne inligting van KG vertrou.", 'tr': 'Birnäçe dilli bilim grafisine (KG) guralýan çykyş çykyşyny çykarmak üçin köp barlamak synanyşy bar. Bu sistemi birnäçe dillerde birnäçe görnüş dünýä bir zada berilýan KG bilen eşleşen guralýar. Böyle döwürler KG aralygynda süýtgetmek üçin kän çyzgylygyň ýeterlikligi ýok edip durulýar. Şol sebäpli, biz Täze bir nusga, JEANS , multi dilli KG we metin korporaty bir paylaşyk taslaýand a meýilleşdirýän bir nusga teklip berýäris we metin üstündeki görkezilişi signallary bilen birleştirmek isleýäris. JEANS ilkinji gezek her KG-i monolingüs metin korpusy bilen birleştirmek üçin bir taýýarlama prosesini çykar. Soňra iki öwrenme prosesi ýene getirilýär: i) KG we her diliň metini bir ýerde kodlamak üçin bir öwrenme prosesi we (ii) özüne öwrenme tabanly çyzygy öwrenme prosesi täzeden bir hereketleriň we integrleriň arasynda täzeden geçirilýär. benchmark veri setirlerinde örän barlamak üçin JEANS birnäçe üns üstünde bir hereket edip barmagy üçin söz berýän ýagdaýyny görkezýär we ol sistemleriň durumyny KG-yň diňe daşary maglumatynda ýok edip bilmeýändir.', 'sq': 'Përpjekje të mëdha kërkimi është vënë në grafikun e njohurive shumëgjuhësore (KG) duke përfshirë metoda për të trajtuar detyrën e përshtatjes së njësisë, e cila kërkon të përshtatet me njësitë në gjuhë të ndryshme specifike KG që referohen në të njëjtin objekt të botës reale. Metodat e tilla shpesh pengohen nga mungesa e rregullimit të farës që ofrohet midis KGs. Prandaj, ne propozojmë një model të ri, JEANS, i cili përfaqëson së bashku KG shumëgjuhës dhe korpra teksti në një skemë të përbashkët përfshirjeje dhe kërkon të përmirësojë përshtatjen e njësisë me sinjalet e mbikqyrjes incidentale nga teksti. JEANS fillimisht vendos një proces themelor njësie për të kombinuar çdo KG me një korpus teksti monogjuhës. Pastaj, janë kryer dy procese mësimi: (i) një proces mësimi për të koduar KG dhe tekstin e çdo gjuhe në një hapësirë përfshirëse dhe (ii) një proces mësimi i përcaktimit me bazë vetë-mësimi për të induktuar në mënyrë të përsëritur korrespondencën e njësive dhe të lexemeve midis përfshirjeve. Eksperimentet në bazat e të dhënave tregojnë se JEANS shpie në përmirësim premtues në përputhjen e njësisë me mbikqyrjen e rastit dhe mbikqyr ndjeshëm metodat më të larta që mbështeten vetëm në informacionin e brendshëm të KG-ve.', 'am': 'Much research effort has been put to multilingual knowledge graph (KG) embedding methods to address the entity alignment task, which seeks to match entities in different languagespecific KGs that refer to the same real-world object.  እንደዚህ ዓይነት ዘሮች በKGs መካከል በተሰጠው የዘር መቀናቀል ፍላጎት ይከለክላሉ፡፡ ስለዚህ በቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች KGs እና የጽሑፍ ኮፕሮፓርን በተካፈለ አዲስ ሞዴል እና በጽሑፍ ማቀናቀል እና አካባቢነትን ማቀናቀል ይፈልጋል፡፡ JEANS አስቀድሞ የጉዳዩ አካባቢ ጉዳይ የKG ጉዳይ በሞሎልቋል የጽሑፍ ኮርፓስ ለመቀላቀል ነው፡፡ በኋላም ሁለት ትምህርት ፕሮጀክቶች ይደረጋሉ:(i) የKG እና የቋንቋውን ጽሑፍ በአንድ ክፍል ውስጥ ለማክበር እና (ii) የራሱ ትምህርት መማር ፕሮጀክት አካባቢዎችን እና በክፍለ ጉዳይ መካከል የሚደረገውን መግለጫ ያስተካክላል፡፡ የbenchmark datasets ፈተናዎች JEANS በጉዳዩ ላይ ማቀናቀል እንዲያሳያል እና በKGs ውስጥነት መረጃ ላይ የሚታመን የሀገር-የart ዘዴዎችን በኩል እንዲያሳያል ያሳያል፡፡', 'bn': 'অনেক গবেষণা প্রচেষ্টা বহুভাষায় জ্ঞান গ্রাফ (কে. জি) বিভিন্ন ভাষায় বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের কাজের কথা বলার উদ্দেশ্যে বিভিন্ন ভাষায় বস্তুর সাথে মিলিয়ে যাওয় এই ধরনের পদ্ধতি প্রায়শই কে- জি- এর মধ্যে প্রদান করা বৃষ্টির সাথে সংযুক্তির অসাধারণ কারণে বাধা দেয়া হয়। যার ফলে আমরা একটি নতুন মডেল, জেয়ান্স, যা একসাথে মাল্টিভাষার কেজি এবং টেক্সট কর্পোরার প্রতিনিধিত্ব করে একটি শেয়ার করা বিভিন্ন প্রকল্পে প্রতিনিধিত্ব করে এবং লেখ জেয়ান্স প্রথমে একটি বস্তুকে গ্রুউন্ডিং প্রক্রিয়া প্রস্তুত করেছে যাতে প্রত্যেক কেজি মোনোলিভাল লেখা লেখা কোর্ তারপর দুই শিক্ষা প্রক্রিয়া অনুষ্ঠিত হচ্ছে: (i) প্রত্যেক ভাষায় কেজি এবং লেক্সের লেখা এনকোড করার জন্য একটি প্রক্রিয়া শিক্ষা প্রক্রিয়া, আর (ii) একটি স্বয়ংক্রিয় ভিত্তিক শিক্ষা শিক্ষা প্রক বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে জেয়ান্স ঘটনার পর্যবেক্ষণের মাধ্যমে সাধারণ সংস্থার উপর উন্নতি প্রতিশ্রুতি প্রদান করেছে এবং গুরুত্বপূর্ণ করে যে', 'hy': 'Շատ հետազոտության ջանքեր են ներդրվել բազմալեզու գիտելիքների գրաֆիկի (KG) մեթոդների վրա, որոնք ներառում են էության հարմարեցման խնդիրը լուծելու համար, որը փորձում է հարմարեցնել տարբեր լեզուներում հատուկ KG-ներ, որոնք վերաբերում են նույն իրական աշխարհի առարկանին: Այս մեթոդները հաճախ խոչընդոտում են KG-ների միջև տրամադրված սերմի անբավարարության պատճառով: Այդ պատճառով, մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր մոդել, Ջեանսը, որը միասին ներկայացնում է բազմալեզու KG-ներ և տեքստի կառուցվածք ընդհանուր ներդրման ծրագրում, և փորձում է բարելավել էության հարմարեցվածությունը տեքստից ստացված պատահական հետևողության ազ Յեանսը առաջին անգամ օգտագործում է էության հիմնադրման գործընթաց, որպեսզի միավորի յուրաքանչյուր կԳ-ը միալեզու տեքստի կորպուսի հետ: Then, two learning processes are conducted: (i) an embedding learning process to encode the KG and text of each language in one embedding space, and (ii) a self-learning based alignment learning process to iteratively induce the correspondence of entities and that of lexemes between embeddings.  Համեմային տվյալների համակարգերի փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ ՅԵՆՍը հանգեցնում է խոստացող զարգացումներին կազմակերպության հարմարեցման պատահական վերահսկման հետ, և նշանակաբար գերազանցում է ամենահետաքրքիր մեթոդները, որոնք միայն հիմնված են ՔԳ-ների', 'az': "Bir çox araştırma çabaları, bir çox dil bilgi grafına (KG) istifadə etmək üçün istifadə etmək üçün istifadə etmək üçün istifadə edilmiş, bu da müxtəlif dillərdə istifadə edən KG-lərə istifadə etmək istəyir. Bütün metodlar KG arasındakı əkin tərəzisinin kifayətindən çəkilir. Beləliklə, biz yeni modeli, JEANS təklif edirik ki, bu çoxlu dil KG və mətn korporası paylaşılmış bir şəkildə təklif edir və mətndən təklif göstərilmiş sinyallərlə birlikdə təklif etmək istəyirik. JEANS ilk dəfə hər KG-ni monodil mətn korpusu ilə birləşdirmək üçün bir entitə tərəfindən istifadə edər. Sonra iki öyrənmə sürəti i şlədilər: i) hər dilin KG və metini bir yerdə kodlamaq üçün istifadə edilən öyrənmə sürəti və ii) özünü öyrənmə dəyişiklik öyrənməsi sürəti təkrarlanması və təkrarlanması arasındakı lexemlərin təkrarlanmasını təşkil edir. Benchmark verilənlərin təcrübələrinin JEANS vəd etdiyi təcrübələrin dəyişiklik gözləməsi barəsindəki təcrübələrin yaxşılıqlarını göstərir və KG'nin sadəcə iç məlumatına təvəkkül edən sanat metodlarını çox üstün edir.", 'bs': 'Mnogi istraživački napori su stavljeni u grafik multijezičkih znanja (KG) ugrađenih metoda za rješavanje zadatka usklađivanja entiteta, koji se trudi da odgovara entitetima u različitim jezicima određenim KG-ima koji se odnose na isti stvarni objekt. Takve metode često sprječavaju nedovoljstvom poravnanja semena koje se pružaju između KG-a. Stoga predlažemo novi model, JEANS , koji zajedno predstavlja multijezičke KGs i tekstualne korporacije u zajedničkom programu integracije, i pokušava poboljšati usklađenje entiteta sa incidentalnim signalima nadzora teksta. JEANS prvi put raspoređuje proces osnova entiteta kako bi kombinirao svaku KG sa monojezičkim tekstskim korpusom. Onda se provede dva procesa učenja: i) proces učenja ugrađenog za kodiranje KG i teksta svakog jezika u jednom ugrađenom prostoru, i ii) proces učenja na samouučenju koji se temelji na učenju usklađenja da ponovno inducira dopisnost entitata i leksa između ugrađenja. Eksperimenti na standardnim podacima pokazuju da JEANS vodi do obećavajućeg poboljšanja o usklađivanju entiteta sa incidentnom nadzorom i značajno iznosi metode stanja umjetnosti koje se oslanjaju samo na unutrašnje informacije o KG-ima.', 'cs': 'Velké výzkumné úsilí bylo vynaloženo na metody vkládání vícejazyčných znalostních grafů (KG) k řešení úlohy zarovnávání entit, která se snaží porovnat entity v různých jazykově specifických KG, které odkazují na stejný objekt reálného světa. Takovým metodám často brání nedostatečná sladění osiva mezi KG. Proto navrhujeme nový model JEANS, který společně reprezentuje vícejazyčné KG a textové korpusy ve sdíleném vkládacím schématu a usiluje o zlepšení sladění entity s náhodnými signály dohledu z textu. JEANS nejprve nasazuje proces uzemnění entity, který kombinuje každou KG s monojazyčným textovým korpusem. Poté jsou provedeny dva učební procesy: (i) proces vkládání učení pro kódování KG a textu každého jazyka do jednoho vkládacího prostoru, a (ii) proces učení založený na samoučení založený na zarovnávání, který iterativně indukuje korespondenci entit a lexemů mezi vkládáním. Experimenty na referenčních datových sadách ukazují, že JEANS vede k slibnému zlepšení sladění subjektů s náhodným dohledem a výrazně překonává nejmodernější metody, které spoléhají pouze na interní informace KG.', 'et': 'Palju teadusuuringuid on tehtud mitmekeelsete teadmisgraafikute (KG) manustamise meetoditele, et tegeleda üksuste joondamise ülesandega, mille eesmärk on sobitada üksused erinevates keelespetsiifilistes KG-ides, mis viitavad samale reaalmaailma objektile. Selliseid meetodeid takistab sageli seemnete ebapiisav vastavusseviimine KG-de vahel. Seetõttu teeme ettepaneku luua uus mudel, JEANS , mis ühiselt esindab mitmekeelseid KG-sid ja tekstikorpuseid ühises süsteemis ning püüab parandada üksuste vastavust tekstist tulenevate juhuslike järelevalvesignaalidega. JEANS kasutab kõigepealt olemi maandamise protsessi, et kombineerida iga KG ühekeelse tekstikorpusega. Seejärel viiakse läbi kaks õppeprotsessi: (i) manustamisprotsess iga keele KG ja teksti kodeerimiseks ühte manustamisruumi ning (ii) eneseõppepõhine joondamisprotsess, et iteratiivselt indutseerida üksuste ja lekseemide vastavust manustamiste vahel. Võrdlusandmekogumitega tehtud eksperimendid näitavad, et JEANS-i tulemusel parandatakse paljutõotavalt üksuste ühtlustamist juhusliku järelevalvega ning see ületab märkimisväärselt kaasaegseid meetodeid, mis tuginevad üksnes KG-i siseteabele.', 'fi': 'Monikielisen tietograafin (KG) upotusmenetelmiin on panostettu paljon tutkimustyötä, jotta voidaan käsitellä entiteettilinjaustehtävää, jossa pyritään sovittamaan yhteen eri kielispesifisissä KG:issä olevia entiteettejä, jotka viittaavat samaan reaalimaailman kohteeseen. Tällaisia menetelmiä vaikeuttaa usein se, että siementen yhteensovittaminen KG:n välillä on riittämätöntä. Siksi ehdotamme uutta mallia, JEANS , joka edustaa yhdessä monikielisiä KG:itä ja tekstikorpusia yhteisessä sulautusjärjestelmässä ja pyrkii parantamaan yksiköiden yhdenmukaisuutta tekstistä saatavien satunnaisten valvontasignaalien kanssa. JEANS ottaa ensin käyttöön kokonaisuuden maadoitusprosessin yhdistääkseen jokaisen KG:n monikieliseen tekstikorpuseen. Tämän jälkeen suoritetaan kaksi oppimisprosessia: (i) upotusoppimisprosessi, jonka avulla kunkin kielen KG ja teksti koodataan yhteen upotustilaan, ja (ii) itseoppimiseen perustuva linjausoppimisprosessi, jolla iteratiivisesti indusoidaan entiteettien ja lekseemien vastaavuus upotusten välillä. Vertailutietoaineistoilla tehdyt kokeet osoittavat, että JEANS-järjestelmä parantaa lupaavasti yksiköiden sopeutumista satunnaiseen valvontaan ja ylittää merkittävästi huipputason menetelmät, jotka perustuvat yksinomaan KG:n sisäisiin tietoihin.', 'ca': "S'ha dedicat molt esforç d'investigació a la gràfica multilingüe del coneixement (KG) incorporant mètodes per abordar la tasca d'alliniament de l'entitat, que busca coincidir entitats en diferents idiomes específics de KG que es refereixen al mateix objecte del món real. Aquests mètodes sovint estan obstaculitzats per l'insuficient alliniament de semilles proporcionat entre KG. Per tant, proposem un nou model, JEANS , que representa conjuntament KG multillengües i text corpora en un esquema d'incorporació compartit, i busca millorar l'alliniament de l'entitat amb senyals de supervisió incidentals del text. JEANS desplaça primer un procés de fundació d'una entitat per combinar cada KG amb el cos text monolingüe. Then, two learning processes are conducted: (i) an embedding learning process to encode the KG and text of each language in one embedding space, and (ii) a self-learning based alignment learning process to iteratively induce the correspondence of entities and that of lexemes between embeddings.  Els experiments en conjunts de dades de referència demostren que JEANS porta a una millora prometedora en l'allinjament de l'entitat amb la supervisió incidental, i supera significativament els mètodes més avançats que confien exclusivament en la informació interna dels KG.", 'jv': 'Menu item to Open \'Search for Open Files\' dialog Yo wis dipoleh akeh sistem sing digawe akeh luwih dumadhi nggawe jadeh neng KGs Awak dhéwé, nggunakake model sing gak enyo, MYANS, sing nggawe ngubah KGs multilengkang karo perusahaan seneng pisan seneng nggawe ngubah winih dhéwé, lan ngelayakno nggawe ngubah luwih-luwih dumadhi winih antara awak dhéwé jEans first deplase sampeyan Entité kanggo sampeyan KG karo perusahaan seneng sampeyan kelas kotak. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Ndeleksyon karo dataset menyang dipunangke dipunangke batik-pernik nik dipunangke dipunangke batik tentang kanggo langkung sampek bantuan ingkang dipunangke dipunangke dipunangke batik, lan akeh iso dianglangno langkung sampek offline', 'sk': 'Veliko raziskovalnih naporov je bilo namenjenih metodam vključevanja večjezičnega grafikona znanja (KG) za obravnavanje naloge poravnave entitet, ki skuša ujemati entitete v različnih jezikovno specifičnih KG, ki se nanašajo na isti objekt realnega sveta. Takšne metode pogosto ovira nezadostna usklajenost semen med KG. Zato predlagamo nov model JEANS , ki skupaj predstavlja večjezične KG in besedilne korpuse v skupni shemi vključevanja ter si prizadeva izboljšati usklajenost subjektov z naključnimi nadzornimi signali iz besedila. JEANS najprej uvede proces ozemljitve entitet, da združi vsako KG z enojezičnim korpusom besedila. Nato se izvajata dva učna procesa: (i) vdelani učni proces za kodiranje KG in besedila vsakega jezika v en vgradni prostor in (ii) samoučni proces usklajevanja, ki iterativno inducira korespondenco entitet in leksemov med vgradnjo. Poskusi na podlagi referenčnih podatkovnih nizov kažejo, da JEANS vodi do obetavnega izboljšanja pri usklajevanju subjektov z naključnim nadzorom in znatno presega najsodobnejše metode, ki se opirajo izključno na notranje informacije KG.', 'ha': "An aiko aikin research masu yawa zuwa grafi na sanarwa na multi-lingui (KG) wanda aka shigar da hanyoyi masu shirya wa aikin juyi-masu abun, wanda yana so zuwa masu kami da abubuwa cikin misãlan KGs da yana gaya zuwa abun da ke cikin cikin halin-duniya. @ info: whatsthis Saboda haka, muna goyyar da wani misali na JEANS, wanda ke tsakanin KGs da matsayin mulki-lingui da ke cikin wani shirin shirin ayuka da aka raba shi, kuma tuna nufi ya gyare masu daidaita da alama masu ƙaranci da ke cikin matsayi. QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu Sa'an nan an cika aikinin su biyu da za'a yi: (i) wani jarraba da za'a iya ƙara kodi KG da matsayin duk harshen cikin filin mai lokaci, da (ii) wani jarrabi na sanar da masu daidaita da masu shawara da kuma wannan lexemi tsakanin filinaiki. Tajararin da ke kanana-bangon ayuka na nuna at JEANS yana ƙara wa gyãra wa tsari na gaskiyar da tsari masu cikin al'amarin, kuma yana mai girma ga shirin-state-of-the-art waɗanda ke dõgara kawai kan information guda na KGs.", 'bo': 'Multilingual knowledge graph (KG)embedding methods to address the entity alignment task, which seeks to match entities in different languages specific KGs that refer to the same real-world object. KGs་དབར་གྱི་ཞེང་ཚད་འདི་དག་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་སྔོན་བསྡད་པའི་གྲལ་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་རྒྱུ་དང་བར་ཆད་བཅུག་པ། དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་གྲངས་གསར་བ་ཞིག་གི་JEANS ལ་མཐུན་སྣ་གྲངས་ཡིག་གི་KGs དང་ཚིག་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག JEANS དང་པོའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་རྒྱབ་ལྗོངས་ཀྱི་ལས་སྦྱོར་འདི་KG རེ་རེར་སོ་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་ཚིག་དང་མཉམ་དུ་སྒྲིག་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། སློབ་ནུས་པའི་ལས་སྦྱོར་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ལས་སྦྱོར་བྱས་ཡོད། Experiments on benchmark datasets show that JEANS leads to promising improvement on entity alignment with incidental supervision, and significantly outperforms state-of-the-art methods that only rely on internal information of KGs.', 'he': "הרבה מאמץ מחקר הופך לגרף ידע רבולוגי (KG) שיטות תוכנית כדי להתייחס למשימת התאמה של היחידות, שמנסה להתאים היחידות בשפתים שונות KG-מיוחדים שמתקשרים לאותו אובייקט בעולם האמיתי. Such methods are often hindered by the insufficiency of seed alignment provided between KGs.  לכן, אנו מציעים מודל חדש, JEANS, שמייצג ביחד KGs רבות שפות וקופורה טקסט בתוכנית שיתוף משותף, ומנסה לשפר את התאמה של היחידות עם אותי פיקוח מקרובים מהטקסט. ג'יינס מפעיל קודם תהליך קרקע יחידה כדי לשלב כל קי-ג'י עם הקורפוס הטקסט המונושפתי. ואז ניהלו שני תהליכים לימודים: (i) תהליך לימודים מעורבים כדי לקוד את KG ולטקסט של כל שפה בחלל מעורבים אחד, ו (ii) תהליך לימוד לימודים מבוסס על לימודים עצמיים כדי לעורר באופן איטראטיבי את התכתבות של יחידות ו של לקסמים בין מעורבים. ניסויים על קבוצות נתונים של רמזים מראים שג'יינס מוביל לשיפור מבטיח על התאמה של היחידות עם פיקוח מקרי, ומעביר משמעות שיטות חדשות ביותר שמסומכות בלבד על מידע פנימי של KG."}
{'en': 'Query Generation for Multimodal Documents', 'es': 'Generación de consultas para documentos multimodales', 'ar': 'إنشاء الاستعلام للمستندات متعددة الوسائط', 'pt': 'Geração de consultas para documentos multimodais', 'zh': '多式文档者询而成之', 'fr': 'Génération de requêtes pour les documents multimodaux', 'ja': 'マルチモーダルドキュメントのクエリ生成', 'hi': 'मल्टीमॉडल दस्तावेज़ों के लिए क्वेरी जनरेशन', 'ru': 'Создание запросов для мультимодальных документов', 'ga': 'Giniúint Iarratas le haghaidh Doiciméad Ilmhódúil', 'hu': 'Lekérdezések generálása multimodális dokumentumokhoz', 'el': 'Δημιουργία ερωτήματος για πολυμοπικά έγγραφα', 'kk': 'Көптеген құжаттар үшін сұраныс құру', 'it': 'Generazione di query per documenti multimodali', 'ka': 'Multimodal დოკუმენტების კითხვის შექმნა', 'ms': 'Penjanaan Pertanyaan untuk Dokumen Multimodal', 'mk': 'Query Generation for Multimodal Documents', 'ml': 'Multimodal രേഖകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ചോദ്യം സൃഷ്ടിക്കുക', 'lt': 'Daugiarūšių dokumentų klausimų generavimas', 'mt': 'Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Talbiet għal Dokumenti Multimodali', 'no': 'Generering av spørjingar for fleire modal dokument', 'pl': 'Generowanie zapytań dla dokumentów multimodalnych', 'ro': 'Generarea interogărilor pentru documente multimodale', 'sr': 'Generacija pitanja za multimodalne dokumente', 'so': 'Soo bixinta dukumentiyada kala duduwan', 'si': 'ගොඩක් මෝඩාල් ලිපිනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්න නිර්මාණය', 'sv': 'Frågsgenerering för multimodala dokument', 'ta': 'Multimodal ஆவணங்களுக்கான கேள்வி உருவாக்கம்', 'ur': 'Multimodal Documents کے لئے کوئر پیدا کرنا', 'mn': 'Олон моделийн баримтуудын төлөвлөгөө үүсгэх', 'vi': 'Truyền liên hệ sao cho tài liệu đa phương', 'uz': 'Ko\xa0ªproq hujjatlar uchun so\xa0ªrov yaratish', 'bg': 'Генериране на заявки за мултимодални документи', 'nl': "Generatie van query's voor multimodale documenten", 'hr': 'Generacija pitanja za multimodalne dokumente', 'de': 'Abfragegenerierung für multimodale Dokumente', 'da': 'Forespørgselsgenerering for multimodale dokumenter', 'id': 'Generasi Pertanyaan untuk Dokumen Multimodal', 'ko': '다중모드 문서의 조회 생성', 'af': 'Navraag Generasie vir Multimodale Dokumente', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i kërkimeve për dokumentet multimodale', 'am': 'ሰነዶች', 'sw': 'Uzalishaji wa swali kwa ajili ya waraka nyingine', 'az': 'Çoxlu modal Dökümələr üçün Soruşma Yapılması', 'bn': 'বহুমোডাল ডকুমেন্টের জন্য অনুসন্ধান', 'tr': 'Çoklumodal Senedler üçin Ýüklemek', 'bs': 'Generacija pitanja za multimodalne dokumente', 'cs': 'Generování dotazů pro multimodální dokumenty', 'ca': 'Query Generation for Multimodal Documents', 'et': 'Mitmeliigiliste dokumentide päringute loomine', 'fa': 'تولید پرسش برای سند چندین مدل', 'hy': 'Query Generation for Multimodal Documents', 'fi': 'Kyselyn luominen multimodaalisille asiakirjoille', 'jv': 'Jenengan Generasi kanggo Dokumen Multimodal', 'he': 'יצירת שאלות עבור מסמכים רבים מודליים', 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje poizvedb za večmodalne dokumente', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྣ་མང་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ཡིག་གེའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ལ་བསྲེ་བ་བཟོ་བ'}
{'en': 'This paper studies the problem of generatinglikely queries for multimodal documents withimages. Our application scenario is enablingefficient first-stage retrieval of relevant doc-uments, by attaching generated queries to doc-uments before indexing. We can then indexthis expanded text to efficiently narrow downto candidate matches using inverted index, sothat expensive reranking can follow. Our eval-uation results show that our proposed multi-modal representation meaningfully improvesrelevance ranking. More importantly, ourframework can achieve the state of the art inthe first stage retrieval scenarios', 'fr': "Cet article étudie le problème de la génération de requêtes probables pour des documents multimodaux contenant des images. Notre scénario d'application permet une «\xa0récupération de première étape\xa0» efficace des documents pertinents, en joignant des requêtes générées aux documents avant l'indexation. Nous pouvons ensuite indexer ce texte développé pour réduire efficacement les correspondances de candidats à l'aide d'un index inversé, de sorte qu'un nouveau classement coûteux puisse suivre. Les résultats de notre évaluation montrent que notre représentation multimodale proposée améliore de manière significative le classement de la pertinence. Plus important encore, notre cadre peut atteindre l'état de l'art dans les scénarios de récupération de première étape", 'es': 'Este artículo estudia el problema de generar consultas probables para documentos multimodales con imágenes. Nuestro escenario de aplicación permite una «recuperación en primera etapa» eficaz de documentos relevantes, adjuntando consultas generadas a los documentos antes de la indexación. Luego podemos indexar este texto expandido para reducirlo de manera eficiente a las coincidencias de candidatos mediante el uso de un índice invertido, de modo que pueda seguir una costosa reclasificación. Los resultados de nuestra evaluación muestran que nuestra representación multimodal propuesta mejora significativamente la clasificación de relevancia. Lo que es más importante, nuestro marco puede alcanzar el estado del arte en los escenarios de recuperación de la primera etapa', 'pt': 'Este artigo estuda o problema de gerar consultas prováveis para documentos multimodais com imagens. Nosso cenário de aplicação está permitindo a “recuperação de primeiro estágio” eficiente de documentos relevantes, anexando consultas geradas a documentos antes da indexação. Podemos então indexar esse texto expandido para restringir com eficiência as correspondências candidatas usando o índice invertido, de modo que a reclassificação cara possa seguir. Nossos resultados de avaliação mostram que nossa representação multimodal proposta melhora significativamente a classificação de relevância. Mais importante, nossa estrutura pode alcançar o estado da arte nos cenários de recuperação do primeiro estágio', 'ja': '本稿では、画像付きマルチモーダルドキュメントに対する可能性の高いクエリを生成する問題について検討する。当社のアプリケーションシナリオは、インデックス作成前に生成されたクエリをドキュメントに添付することにより、関連するドキュメント管理の効率的な「第1段階の取得」を可能にします。この拡張されたテキストをインデックスを使用して効率的に候補の一致を絞り込むことができます。高価な再ランキングが続く可能性があります。私たちの評価結果は、提案されたマルチモーダル表現が有意義に関連性ランキングを改善することを示しています。さらに重要なことに、私たちの研究は、最初の段階の検索シナリオで最先端を達成することができます', 'zh': '本文究为多模式文档生成类问。 吾侪以场景因编索引之前,附以成文档,以成文档高效"第一阶段检索"。 然后可索引广文本,以倒排索引缩小,故或贵重排名。 吾评结果表明,吾言多模态示有义而名之也。 更要,我们的框架可以在第一阶段检索场景中得到最先进的技术水平。', 'ar': 'تدرس هذه الورقة مشكلة توليد الاستعلامات المحتملة للوثائق متعددة الوسائط مع الصور. يعمل سيناريو التطبيق الخاص بنا على تمكين "استرجاع المرحلة الأولى" الفعال للمستندات ذات الصلة ، من خلال إرفاق الاستعلامات التي تم إنشاؤها بالمستندات قبل الفهرسة. يمكننا بعد ذلك فهرسة هذا النص الموسع لتضييق نطاق التطابقات المرشحة باستخدام الفهرس المقلوب ، بحيث يمكن أن يتبع ذلك إعادة التصنيف المكلفة. تُظهر نتائج التقييم لدينا أن التمثيل متعدد الوسائط الذي اقترحناه يعمل على تحسين ترتيب الصلة بشكل مفيد. والأهم من ذلك ، يمكن لإطارنا تحقيق أحدث ما توصلت إليه التقنية في سيناريوهات استرجاع المرحلة الأولى', 'ru': 'В этой статье изучается проблема генерациивероятных запросов для мультимодальных документов с изображениями. Наш сценарий приложения позволяет эффективно «извлекать на первом этапе» соответствующие doc-uments, прикрепляя сгенерированные запросы к doc-uments перед индексированием. Затем мы можем индексировать этот расширенный текст, чтобы эффективно сузить круг совпадений-кандидатов, используя инвертированный индекс, за которым может последовать дорогостоящее перерейтинг. Наши результаты оценки показывают, что предлагаемое мультимодальное представление значительно улучшаетрелевантность ранжирования. Что более важно, наша работа может достичь уровня в сценариях поиска на первом этапе', 'hi': 'यह पेपर छवियों के साथ मल्टीमॉडल दस्तावेजों के लिए समान रूप से क्वेरी उत्पन्न करने की समस्या का अध्ययन करता है। हमारे आवेदन परिदृश्य को प्रासंगिक doc-uments केefficient "प्रथम-चरण पुनर्प्राप्ति" को सक्षम कर रहा है, अनुक्रमणिका से पहले डॉक-uments के लिए उत्पन्न क्वेरीज़ संलग्न करके। फिर हम इस विस्तारित पाठ को उलटे सूचकांक का उपयोग करके डाउनटू उम्मीदवार मैचों को कुशलतापूर्वक संकीर्ण करने के लिए अनुक्रमित कर सकते हैं, ताकि महंगी रीरैंकिंग का पालन किया जा सके। हमारे eval-uation परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारे प्रस्तावित बहु-मोडल प्रतिनिधित्व सार्थक रूप से प्रासंगिक रैंकिंग में सुधार करते हैं। इससे भी महत्वपूर्ण बात यह है कि हमारा फ्रेमवर्क पहले चरण के पुनर्प्राप्ति परिदृश्यों में कला की स्थिति को प्राप्त कर सकता है', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo staidéar ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le fiosruithe dóchúla a ghiniúint do dhoiciméid ilmhódacha le híomhánna. Is é ár gcás iarratais ná “aisghabháil chéad chéime” éifeachtach na ndoiciméad ábhartha a chumasú, trí fhiosrúcháin ginte a cheangal le doiciméid roimh innéacsú. Is féidir linn an téacs leathnaithe seo a innéacsú ansin chun meaitseálacha na n-iarrthóirí a chaolú go héifeachtach trí úsáid a bhaint as innéacs inbhéartaithe, ionas gur féidir athrangú costasach a leanúint. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí meastóireachta go bhfeabhsaítear ár n-ionadaíocht ilmhódach atá beartaithe go bríoch le rangú ábharthachta. Níos tábhachtaí fós, is féidir lenár gcreat den scoth a bhaint amach sna cásanna aisghabhála céadchéime', 'ka': "ამ დოკუმენტის პრობლემების შექმნა მულტიმოდიალური დოკუმენტებისთვის კითხვების შექმნა. ჩვენი პროგრამის სინარიო შესაძლებელია შესაბამისი doc- დომენტების 'პირველი- ფაეჯის მიღება', შესაბამისი კითხვები doc- დომენტებზე ინდექსირების წინ დამატებით. შემდეგ ჩვენ შეგვიძლია ინდექსტის გაფართლებული ტექსტის ინდექსტის გამოყენება, რომელიც გამოყენებული ინდექსტის გამოყენებას გამოყენებული კონდიდეტების შესაძლებელად გამო ჩვენი წლის წარმოდგენების შედეგი ჩვენი მრავალური მოდიალური გამოსახულება უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უ უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, ჩვენი ფრამეტრი შეიძლება წარმოიდგინოთ ხელსაწყოთან პირველი ფაეზის მიღება სინარიოში", 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία μελετά το πρόβλημα της δημιουργίας πιθανών ερωτήσεων για πολυμορφικά έγγραφα με εικόνες. Το σενάριο εφαρμογής μας επιτρέπει την αποτελεσματική "ανάκτηση πρώτου σταδίου" των σχετικών εγγράφων, επισυνάπτοντας τα παραγόμενα ερωτήματα στα έγγραφα πριν από την ευρετηρίαση. Στη συνέχεια, μπορούμε να προσθέσουμε ευρετήριο σε αυτό το διευρυμένο κείμενο για να περιορίσουμε αποτελεσματικά τους αγώνες υποψηφίων χρησιμοποιώντας το αντίστροφο δείκτη, έτσι ώστε να μπορεί να ακολουθήσει δαπανηρή επανακατάταξη. Τα αποτελέσματα αξιολόγησής μας δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη πολυμορφική αναπαράσταση βελτιώνει σημαντικά την κατάταξη καταλληλότητας. Πιο σημαντικό, το πλαίσιο μας μπορεί να επιτύχει την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας στα σενάρια ανάκτησης πρώτου σταδίου', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány a multimodális dokumentumok képekkel való valószínűtlen lekérdezésének problémáját vizsgálja. Alkalmazási forgatókönyvünk lehetővé teszi a releváns dokumentumok "első lépésben történő lekérdezését" azáltal, hogy a generált lekérdezéseket a dokumentumokhoz csatolja az indexelés előtt. Ezt követően indexelhetjük ezt a kiterjesztett szöveget, hogy hatékonyan szűkítsük le a jelölt egyezésekre fordított index segítségével, így a drága újraindítás következhet. Értékelési eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy javasolt multimodális reprezentációnk jelentősen javítja a relevancia rangsorolását. Ami még fontosabb, keretrendszerünk elérheti a legkorszerűbb technológiát az első fázisú visszakeresési forgatókönyvekben', 'it': 'Questo articolo studia il problema della generazione di domande probabileper documenti multimodali conimmagini. Il nostro scenario applicativo consente un efficiente "recupero in prima fase" dei documenti pertinenti, allegando query generate ai documenti prima dell\'indicizzazione. Possiamo quindi indicizzare questo testo espanso per restringere in modo efficiente le corrispondenze dei candidati utilizzando l\'indice invertito, in modo da poter seguire costose ricalcolarizzazioni. I nostri risultati di valutazione mostrano che la nostra proposta di rappresentazione multimodale migliora significativamente la classifica di rilevanza. Ancora più importante, il nostro framework può raggiungere lo stato dell\'arte negli scenari di recupero della prima fase', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente nagrinėjama daugiarūšio pobūdžio dokumentų klausimų su vaizdais sukūrimo problema. Mūsų taikymo scenarijus yra veiksmingas atitinkamų dokumentų pirmojo etapo atgavimas, pridedant sukauptus klausimus prie dokumentų prieš indeksavimą. Tuomet galime indeksuoti šį išplėstą tekstą, kad veiksmingai susiaurintume iki kandidatų konkursų, naudodami invertuotą indeksą, kad brangus perskaičiavimas galėtų būti vykdomas. Mūsų vertinimo rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų siūlomas daugiarūšio transporto atstovavimas reikšmingai pagerina svarbą. Svarbiausia, mūsų sistema gali pasiekti pažangiausius pirmojo etapo atkūrimo scenarijus', 'kk': "Бұл қағаз кескіндермен бірнеше модель құжаттардың сұрауларын құру мәселесін зерттеді. Біздің қолданбаның сценариясы индекстеу алдында құрылған сұраныстарды документтерге тіркеп 'бірінші- этап' деген документтерді алу мүмкін болады. Содан кейін кеңейтілген мәтіннің индексін, кандидаттардың сәйкестіктеріне көмектесу үшін көмектесетін индексті түсіріп аламыз. Біздің көптеген көптеген кеңейту нәтижелеріміздің көптеген кеңейтулеріміздің көптеген көптеген кеңейтулеріміз дегенді көрсетеді. Ең маңызды, біздің фрейміміз бірінші этап алу сценариясында", 'ms': "This paper studies the problem of generatinglikely queries for multimodal documents withimages.  Our application scenario is enablingefficient 'first-stage retrieval' of relevant doc-uments, by attaching generated queries to doc-uments before indexing.  Kemudian, kita boleh mengindeks teks yang dilambangkan ini dengan efisien sempit ke perlawanan calon menggunakan indeks terbaliknya, sehingga penyelesaian semula mahal boleh mengikuti. Keputusan penilaian kami menunjukkan bahawa persembahan multi modal yang kami cadangkan secara bermakna meningkatkan peringkat pertimbangan. Yang lebih penting, kerangka kita boleh mencapai keadaan terbaik dalam skenario pemulihan tahap pertama", 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jistudja l-problema tal-ġenerazzjoni ta’ mistoqsijiet probabbli għal dokumenti multimodali b’immaġni. Ix-xenarju ta’ applikazzjoni tagħna huwa li tippermetti l-“irkupru fl-ewwel stadju” effiċjenti ta’ dokumenti rilevanti, billi teħel mistoqsijiet iġġenerati mad-dokumenti qabel l-indiċjar. Imbagħad nistgħu nindikaw dan it-test estiż biex b’mod effiċjenti nidaqqsu għall-logħob tal-kandidati bl-użu ta’ indiċi invers, b’tali mod li jista’ jsegwi r-rieżami mill-ġdid għali. Our eval-uation results show that our proposed multi-modal representation meaningfully improvesrelevance ranking. Aktar importanti minn hekk, il-qafas tagħna jista’ jikseb l-aktar livell avvanzat fix-xenarji ta’ rkupru fl-ewwel stadju', 'mn': "Энэ цаас зурагтай олон моделийн баримтуудын асуудлыг бий болгох асуудлыг судалдаг. Бидний хэрэглээний хувилбар нь индекс гарахын өмнө үүсгэсэн квери документүүдэд хангалттай 'анхны этап авах' боломжтой болгож байна. Дараа нь бид түүний өргөн текстүүдийг эргүүлсэн индексийг ашиглан захирагчдын өргөн мөргөлдөө үр дүнтэй багасгаж болно. Бидний зууны дараагийн үр дүнд бидний олон загварын үзүүлэлтийг илэрхийлж байгааг харуулж байна. Хамгийн чухал нь бидний хөрөнгө оруулалтын байдал эхний шатанд", 'mk': 'Овој документ го проучува проблемот со генерирањето веројатно прашања за мултимодилни документи со слики. Нашиот сценарио за апликација овозможува ефикасно „прва фаза преземање“ на релевантните документи, прикачувајќи ги генерираните прашања на документите пред индексирање. Потоа можеме да го индексираме овој проширен текст за ефикасно да се приближиме до кандидатските натпревари со искористување на индексот, за да може да следи скапо повторно разгледување. Нашите резултати од проценката покажуваат дека нашето предложено мултимодално претставување значително го подобрува релевантното рангирање. Поважно е дека нашата рамка може да го постигне најдоброто во првата фаза', 'ro': 'Această lucrare studiază problema generării probabil a interogărilor pentru documentele multimodale cu imagini. Scenariul nostru de aplicare permite recuperarea eficientă a documentelor relevante prin atașarea interogărilor generate la documente înainte de indexare. Putem apoi indextă acest text extins pentru a restrânge eficient până la potrivirile candidate folosind indicele inversat, astfel încât să poată urma o re-ranking costisitoare. Rezultatele evaluării arată că reprezentarea multimodală propusă îmbunătăţeşte semnificativ clasamentul de relevanţă. Mai important, cadrul nostru poate atinge stadiul tehnologiei în scenariile de recuperare a primei etape', 'ml': "ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d ചിത്രങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി സാധ്യതയുള്ള ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ പ്രയോഗത്തിന്റെ സിനാറിയോ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഡോക്ടറുകളുടെ 'ആദ്യ-സ്റ്റേജ് വീണ്ടെടുക്കുക' എന്ന സാധ്യതയുള്ളതാണ്. സൂക്ഷി We can then indexthis expanded text to efficiently narrow downto candidate matches using inverted index, sothat expensive reranking can follow.  നമ്മുടെ പ്രോദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട പല മോഡല്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണ്, നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് ആദ്യ സ്റ്റേജിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d", 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł bada problem generowania prawdopodobnych zapytań dla dokumentów multimodalnych z obrazami. Nasz scenariusz aplikacji umożliwia efektywne "pobieranie pierwszego etapu" odpowiednich dokumentów poprzez dołączanie generowanych zapytań do dokumentów przed indeksowaniem. Następnie możemy zindeksować ten rozszerzony tekst, aby skutecznie zawęzić dopasowania kandydatów za pomocą indeksu odwróconego, dzięki czemu możemy nastąpić kosztowne zmiany rankingu. Nasze wyniki oceny pokazują, że proponowana przez nas reprezentacja multimodalna znacząco poprawia ranking relevantności. Co ważniejsze, nasze ramy mogą osiągnąć najnowocześniejszy stan techniki w pierwszym etapie odzyskiwania scenariuszy', 'si': "මේ පත්තුව පින්තූරය සමඟ ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා. අපේ වැඩසටහන සිනාරියෝ සක්\u200dරිය කරන්නේ සම්බන්ධ Doc- ලිපිළිබඳ ස්ථානය 'පළමු ස්ථානය ආරක්ෂා කරන්න' සක්\u200dරිය කරනවා, නිර්මාණ පස්සේ අපිට පුළුවන් විශාල පාළුවන් සංකේතය සඳහා විශාල පාළුවන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් විශාල පාළුවන් විසි අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියලා වැදගත් වැදගත්, අපේ ක්\u200dරියාමාර්ගය පුළුවන් කළුණාගේ ස්ථිතියට පළමු ස්ථානය ආරක්ෂාව සිද්ධ", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats undersöker problemet med att generera frågor om multimodala dokument med bilder. Vårt applikationsscenario möjliggör effektiv "första steg hämtning" av relevanta dokument, genom att bifoga genererade frågor till dokument innan indexering. Vi kan sedan indexera denna utvidgade text för att effektivt begränsa till kandidatmatcher med hjälp av inverterat index, så att dyr omräkning kan följa. Våra utvärderingsresultat visar att vår föreslagna multimodala representation avsevärt förbättrar relevansrapporteringen. Ännu viktigare är att vårt ramverk kan uppnå den senaste tekniken i scenarierna för första etappen.', 'ta': "இந்த தாள் பிரச்சனையை உருவாக்குதல் பிரச்சனைகளுக்கு பல்முறையான ஆவணங்களுக்காக படிக்கிறது. எங்கள் பயன்பாட்டு தோற்றம் தொடர்புடைய ஆவணங்களின் 'முதல் நிலை மீட்டெடுப்பு' செயல்படுத்துகிறது, அட்டவணை முன்னால் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட கேள்வ முதலீட்டு சுட்டுவரிசையை பயன்படுத்தி முதலீட்டு சுட்டுவரிசைகளுக்கு விரிவாக்கப்பட்ட உரையை சுருக்க முடியும் நம்முடைய eval uation results show that our proposed multi-modal representation means improvement ranking. முக்கியமாக, எங்கள் சட்டத்தில் முதல் முடிவு பெறுவதற்கான திட்டத்தின் நிலையை பெற முடியும்", 'ur': "یہ کاغذ مطالعہ کرتا ہے کہ بہت سی موڈل ڈیکومڈیٹوں کے ساتھ سوال پیدا کرنے کی مشکل ہے۔ ہماری کاربرد سناریو تعلق داروں کے 'پہلی مرحلہ پھیرنے' کو امکان دیتا ہے، اس کے ذریعہ سے پہلے ڈاکٹ منڈ کے ساتھ پیدا کئے ہوئے سواریاں پیدا کر دیتے ہیں. پھر ہم اس کے پھیلائے پیغام کو اثبات کے ساتھ کاندینڈیٹ کے مطابق تنگ کر سکتے ہیں، اس کے مطابق پیغام کے مطابق پیغام کے مطابق۔ ہمارے دنیاوی جگہ کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہماری پیشنهاد بہت سی موڈال کی نمایش کا معنی یہ ہے کہ levance رینگ کو بہتر کرتا ہے۔ اس سے زیادہ اہم بات ہے کہ ہمارے فرم هنر کی موقعیت پہلی مرحلہ میں پہنچا سکتی ہے", 'so': "Warqaddaas wuxuu ka baranayaa dhibaatada soo saarista su'aalaha suurtagalka ah ee dukumentiyada kala duduwan. Muuqashada codsigayada ayaa faa’iido u yeelan kara 'dib u soo celinta marka hore' ee dukumentiyada la xiriira, iyadoo lagu xiriira su'aalo la soo saaray oo la soo saaro dukumentiyada ka hor inta aan la indexin. Markaas waxaynu suurtogal ka dhigi karnaa warqadiisa la ballaadhiyay si aad u sahlan karno, si aan ugu fududeyn karno mushaarkii uu isticmaalo index lagu beddelay, taasoo ay dib u soo celin karto qiimo qaali ah. Abaalkayaga qiimeynta ayaa tusaya in noogu soo jeeday aragtideena kala duduwan, taasoo loogu talo galay inuu beddelo koritaanka. More importantly, ourframework can achieve the state of the art inthe first stage retrieval scenarios", 'no': 'Denne papiret studierer problemet med å laga sannsynleg spørjingar for fleire modal dokument med bilete. Programscenarioen vårt er slått på at det er tilgjengeleg å henta første stad med relevant doc- dokument, ved å leggja oppretta spørjingar til doc- dokument før indeksering. Vi kan derfor indeksera utvida teksten til å effektivt snu ned til kandidattreff med inverterte indekser, slik at dykka tilbakeanking kan følgja. Våre årlige utviklingslinjer viser at vårt foreslått fleire modal representasjon betydelig forbedrar levensranking. Det viktigere er at vårt rammeverk kan nå kunstået i første staden henting av scenarioar', 'sr': "Ovaj papir proučava problem stvaranjaverovatnih pitanja za multimodalne dokumente sa slikama. Naš scenarij aplikacije omogućava dovoljno 'primanja prve faze' relevantnih dokumenta, priključujući proizvedene pitanja dokumentima pre indeksa. Onda možemo indeksovati prošireni tekst da efikasno smanjimo kandidatske utakmice koristeći obrnuti indeks, što može pratiti skupo preokretanje. Naši rezultati prošlog veka pokazuju da naša predložena multimodalna predstavljanja značajno poboljšava ranking levanstva. Što je važnije, naš okvir može postići stanje umjetnosti u prvim scenarijama povratka", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này nghiên cứu vấn đề về các câu hỏi về các tài liệu đa phương với ảnh. Khả năng ứng dụng của chúng ta là khả năng "lấy dữ liệu giai đoạn đầu" bằng cách đặt các câu hỏi vào hồ sơ trước khi nhập. Chúng ta có thể thêm văn bản mở rộng của anh ta vào việc hạn chế hiệu quả các ứng viên khi chơi với chỉ mục ngược, để có thể lần lại đắt tiền. Những kết quả đánh giá đánh giá cho thấy mức độ quan trọng của chúng ta Quan trọng hơn, chúng ta có thể đạt được trạng thái nghệ thuật trong viễn cảnh tìm kiếm đầu tiên.', 'uz': "Ushbu qogʻoz rasmlar bilan ko'proq hujjatlar uchun soʻrovlar yaratish muammolarini o'rganadi. @ info Keyin biz cheksiz o'zgartirish indeksi bilan ishlab chiqarishimiz mumkin. Ko'rib chiqarish natijalarimizni ko'rsatadi, bizning ko'plab-modal taqdimotimizni o'zgartirish imkoniyatini o'zgartiradi. Muhimlik bo'lsa, bizning uslubi birinchi darajaga qayta olish sahnalarning holatini topishi mumkin", 'nl': "Deze paper bestudeert het probleem van het genereren van waarschijnlijke query's voor multimodale documenten met afbeeldingen. Ons toepassingsscenario maakt het mogelijk om relevante documenten in de eerste fase op te halen, door gegenereerde query's aan documenten te koppelen alvorens te indexeren. We kunnen deze uitgebreide tekst vervolgens indexeren om efficiënt tot kandidaat-matches te beperken met behulp van omgekeerde index, zodat dure herbeoordeling kan volgen. Uit onze evaluatieresultaten blijkt dat onze voorgestelde multimodale representatie de relevantieranking zinvol verbetert. Wat nog belangrijker is, kan ons raamwerk de stand van de techniek bereiken in de eerste fase van het ophalen van scenario's", 'da': "Dette dokument undersøger problemet med at generere sandsynligvis forespørgsler om multimodale dokumenter med billeder. Vores applikationsscenario muliggør effektiv 'første trin hentning' af relevante dokumenter ved at vedhæfte genererede forespørgsler til dokumenter før indeksering. Vi kan derefter indeksere denne udvidede tekst for effektivt at indsnævre kandidatkampe ved hjælp af omvendt indeks, så dyr genranking kan følge. Vores evalueringsresultater viser, at vores foreslåede multimodale repræsentation i betydelig grad forbedrer relevansrapporten. Endnu vigtigere er, at vores rammer kan opnå den nyeste teknologi i første fase hentningsscenarier", 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag untersucht das Problem, wahrscheinliche Abfragen für multimodale Dokumente mit Bildern zu generieren. Unser Anwendungsszenario ermöglicht ein effizientes "First-Stage Retrieval" relevanter Dokumente, indem generierte Abfragen an Dokumente vor der Indizierung angehängt werden. Wir können diesen erweiterten Text dann indexieren, um mithilfe des invertierten Index effizient auf Kandidaten-Matches einzugrenzen, sodass teure Neurangierungen folgen können. Unsere Evaluationsergebnisse zeigen, dass unsere vorgeschlagene multimodale Repräsentation das Relevanzranking sinnvoll verbessert. Noch wichtiger ist, dass unser Framework den Stand der Technik in den Retrievalszenarien der ersten Stufe erreichen kann.', 'ko': "본고는 이미지를 바탕으로 하는 다중모드 문서가 조회할 수 있는 생성 문제를 연구했다.우리의 응용 장면은 색인을 하기 전에 생성된 조회를 문서에 추가함으로써 관련 문서의 효율적인'1단계 검색'을 실현하는 것이다.그 다음에, 우리는 이 확장된 텍스트를 역렬 인덱스로 인덱스해서 후보가 일치하는 것으로 효과적으로 축소할 수 있으며, 이렇게 하면 비싼 재배열을 할 수 있다.우리의 평가 결과에 따르면 우리가 제시한 다중모드는 의미 있게 순위를 높였다고 한다.더욱 중요한 것은 우리의 프레임워크가 1단계 검색 장면에서 가장 선진적인 수준에 도달할 수 있다는 것이다", 'bg': 'Настоящата статия изследва проблема за генериране на вероятни заявки за мултимодални документи с изображения. Нашият сценарий на приложение позволява ефективно "извличане на първи етап" на съответните документи, чрез прикачване на генерирани заявки към документите преди индексиране. След това можем да индексираме разширения текст, за да стесним ефикасно надолу до мачовете на кандидатите, използвайки обърнат индекс, така че да може да последва скъпо пренареждане. Резултатите от оценката показват, че предложеното от нас мултимодално представяне значително подобрява класирането на релевантността. По-важното е, че нашата рамка може да постигне най-доброто в сценариите за извличане на данни от първия етап', 'hr': "Ovaj papir proučava problem stvaranjaverovatnih pitanja za multimodalne dokumente s slikama. Naš scenarij aplikacije omogućava dovoljno 'primanje prve faze' relevantnih dokumenta, priključujući proizvedene ispitivanja dokumentima prije indeksa. Onda možemo indeksirati prošireni tekst kako bi učinkovito smanjili utakmice kandidata koristeći obrnuti indeks, što može slijediti skupo preokretanje. Naši rezultati vjekovnih uvjeta pokazuju da je naša predložena multimodalna predstavljanja značajno poboljšala uvjetnost. Što je važnije, naš okvir može postići stanje umjetnosti u prvoj fazi scenarija povratka", 'id': "Kertas ini mempelajari masalah menghasilkan pertanyaan untuk dokumen multimodal dengan gambar. Skenario aplikasi kami memungkinkan 'penghasilan tahap pertama' dari dokumen-dokumen relevanti, dengan menambah pertanyaan yang dibuat ke dokumen-dokumen sebelum mengindeks. We can then indexthis expanded text to efficiently narrow downto candidate matches using inverted index, sothat expensive reranking can follow.  Hasil evaluasi kami menunjukkan bahwa representation multi modal kami yang diusulkan secara berarti meningkatkan rangkaian relevansi. Yang paling penting, kerangka kita dapat mencapai keadaan terbaik dalam skenario penemuan tahap pertama", 'fa': 'این کاغذ مشکل تولید کردن سؤال احتمالات برای مدارک چند مدال با تصاویر را مطالعه می\u200cکند. سیناریو کاربرد ما برای بازیابی اولین مرحله\u200cای از مدارک\u200cهای مربوط به اندازه کافی تواناست، با پیوند سوال\u200cهای تولید شده به مدارک پیش از تنظیم کردن سفارش\u200cهای دکتر. سپس می\u200cتوانیم متن گسترده\u200cاش را با استفاده از نشانه\u200cهای متغیر تغییر دهیم تا به طور موثر به مسابقه\u200cهای کاندیده\u200cها تنگ شود. نتیجه\u200cهای تغییرات جهانی ما نشان می\u200cدهند که پیشنهاد نمایش\u200cهای متعددی ما به عنوان رشته\u200cهای تغییر بالا می\u200cدهد. مهمتر تر از این، چهارچوب ما می تواند وضعیت هنر را در سناریوهای اولین مرحله بازیافت کند', 'sw': "Makala hii inasoma tatizo la kutengeneza maswali yanayoweza kwa ajili ya nyaraka nyingi pamoja na picha. Mtandao wetu wa matumizi unaweza kuwa na ufanisi wa 'kurudishwa kwa hatua ya kwanza' wa waraka muhimu za madaktari, kwa kuunganisha maswali yaliyotengenezwa kwenye nyaraka za madaktari kabla ya kubadilishwa. Kisha tunaweza kuandika ujumbe wake ulipandishwa kwa ufanisi kupunguza mabadiliko ya wagombea kwa kutumia indexe lililowekwa, kwa hiyo upya wa bei unaweza kufuatia. Matokeo yetu ya ufuatiliaji yanaonyesha kwamba uwakilishi wetu wa namna nyingi unavyopendekezwa kwa makundi yanayomaanisha kuboresha kiwango cha juu. More importantly, ourframework can achieve the state of the art inthe first stage retrieval scenarios", 'sq': "This paper studies the problem of generatinglikely queries for multimodal documents withimages.  Skenari ynë i aplikimit është duke aktivizuar 'marrjen në fazën e parë' e dokumenteve të rëndësishme, duke i bashkuar pyetjet e gjeneratuara dokumenteve përpara indeksimit. Pastaj mund të indeksojmë tekstin e zgjeruar në mënyrë të ngushtë në mënyrë efektive për ndeshjet kandidate duke përdorur indeksin e invertuar, kështu që mund të ndjekë ripërlidhjet e shtrenjta. Our eval-uation results show that our proposed multi-modal representation meaningfully improvesrelevance ranking. Më e rëndësishmja është se kuadri ynë mund të arrijë gjendjen e teknologjisë në skenarët e kërkimit në fazën e parë", 'am': "ይህ ፕሮግራም የባሕላዊ ጠያፊዎችን ለመፍጠር የሚችሉትን ጥያቄዎች እና መልዕክቶች ያስተምራል፡፡ Our application scenario is enablingefficient 'first-stage retrieval' of relevant doc-uments, by attaching generated queries to doc-uments before indexing.  የዚያን ጊዜም የተሰፋው ጽሑፉን ለመጠቀም በተለየ ማነሻ ተቃውሞ ለማነሳቀስ እናችላለን፣ ዋጋው ማውጣት ይችላል፡፡ የውጤት ፍጥረታችን የተዘጋጀን ብዙዎች የሞዴል መልዕክታችንን የክፍለ ውጤት ማድረግ ማድረግ እንደሆነ ያሳየናል፡፡ ይልቁንም የበለጠ፣ የፍሬማነታችን የዐርብ ግንኙነት ለመጀመሪያ ተቃውሞ ስዕይን ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡", 'hy': 'Այս թղթին ուսումնասիրում է պատկերների միջոցով հավանաբար բազմամոդալ փաստաթղթերի հարցեր ստեղծելու խնդիրը: Մեր ծրագրի սցենարիան հնարավորություն է տալիս արդյունավետ "առաջին փուլում վերցնել" նշանակալի փաստաթղթեր, միացնելով ստեղծված հարցերը փաստաթղթերի հետ մինչև ինդեքսիվորումը: Այնուհետև մենք կարող ենք ինդեքստել այս ընդլայնված տեքստը, որպեսզի արդյունավետ սահմանափակենք թեկնածու համապատասխանները\' օգտագործելով հակառակ ինդեքսը, այնպես որ թանկ վերարտահայտությունը կարող է հետևել: Մեր գնահատման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկած բազմամոդային ներկայացումը իմաստորեն բարելավում է կարևոր դասակարգը: Ամենակարևոր է, որ մեր շրջանակը կարող է հասնել առաջին աստիճանի վերականգնման սցենարին', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি ছবির সাথে মাল্টিমোডাল ডকুমেন্টের জন্য সম্ভবত অনুসন্ধানের সমস্যা গবেষণা করছে। আমাদের অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের দৃশ্য সংক্রান্ত ডকুমেন্টগুলোর প্রথম স্টেড পুনরুদ্ধার সক্রিয় করে, সংক্রান্ত ডকুমেন্টের আগে ডকুমেন্ট তারপর আমরা তার বিস্তৃত টেক্সট বিস্তারিত প্রার্থীদের কাছে কার্যকর পরিবর্তন করার জন্য প্রার্থীদের খেলাগুলো কমাতে পারি, যার ফলে  আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত বহুমোডাল প্রতিনিধিত্বের ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত বহুমোডালের প্রতিনিধিত্ আরো গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, আমাদের কাঠামো প্রথম পর্যায়ের পুনরুদ্ধারের পরিস্থিতি অর্জন করতে পারে', 'bs': "Ovaj papir proučava problem stvaranjaverovatnih pitanja za multimodalne dokumente sa slikama. Naš scenarij aplikacije omogućava dovoljno 'primanje prve faze' relevantnih dokumenta, priključujući proizvedene pitanja dokumentima prije indeksa. Onda možemo indeksirati prošireni tekst da učinkovito smanjimo utakmice kandidata koristeći obrnuti indeks, što može pratiti skupo preokretanje. Naši rezultati proizvodnje vjekova pokazuju da naša predložena multimodalna predstavljanja značajno poboljšava ranking levanstva. Što je važnije, naš okvir može postići stanje umjetnosti u prvim scenarijama povratka faze", 'az': 'Bu kağıt çoxlu modal dökümlər üçün mümkün sorğular yaratmaq problemini öyrənir. Bizim uyğulama senaryosumuz mövcud doc-dokumentlərin ilk dəfə alınmasını qabilleştirir, indeks etmədən əvvəl dökümətlərə ürəklənmiş sualları bağlayır. Sonra onun genişləndirilmiş məktubunu, müəyyən edilmiş indiks vasitəsilə müəyyən edilən kandidəyə düşürüb azaltmaq üçün indiks edə bilərik. Qaydalarımızın nəticələrimiz göstərir ki, bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz çoxlu modal göstərişliyimiz dəyişiklik dəyişikliklərini yaxşılaşdırmaq anlamına gəlir. Daha da önemlidir ki, bizim frameworkımız ilk fərz alma senaryosunda sanatın durumunu başa düşə bilər.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz multimodal sened bilen soraglary bejermek üçin mesele okaýar. Biziň uygulama senarymyz möhüm doc-dökümleriniň 'ilkinji-staz alymy' mümkin edip biljek dökümlere soraglary baglaýar. Sonra genişletilmiş metini kandidata eşleşmeleri kullanarak etkinlik şekilde düşürmek üçin indeks yapabiliriz. Yüksek çağlarımızın sonuçlarımız, bizim teklifimizin çomodal temsil edilmesinin anlamlı şekilde düzeltmesi gerektiğini gösteriyor. Daha möhüm bolsa, biziň frameworkymyz sungatyň durumyny ilkinji sahypa alma senaryýasynda ýetip biler.", 'cs': 'Tento článek se zabývá problematikou generování pravděpodobných dotazů pro multimodální dokumenty s obrázky. Náš aplikační scénář umožňuje efektivní "první fázi vyhledávání" relevantních dokumentů připojením generovaných dotazů k dokumentům před indexováním. Tento rozšířený text pak můžeme indexovat, abychom efektivně zúžili zápasy kandidátů pomocí invertovaného indexu, takže následuje drahé přehodnocení. Naše výsledky hodnocení ukazují, že naše navrhovaná multimodální reprezentace významně zlepšuje hodnocení relevance. Ještě důležitější je, že náš rámec může dosáhnout stavu techniky v první fázi scénářů vyhledávání', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis uuritakse tõenäoliselt päringute tekitamise probleemi multimodaalsete dokumentidega piltidega. Meie rakendusstsenaarium võimaldab asjakohaste dokumentide esimese etapi hankimist, lisades loodud päringud dokumentidele enne indekseerimist. Seejärel saame selle laiendatud teksti indekseerida, et vähendada tõhusalt kandidaatide vasteteni pööratud indeksi abil, et järgneda kulukas ümberpaigutamine. Meie hindamistulemused näitavad, et meie pakutud mitmeliigiliste transpordiliikide esindatus parandab oluliselt asjakohasuse järjestust. Mis veelgi tähtsam, meie raamistik võib saavutada tehnika taseme esimese etapi taastamisstsenaariumides', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa tutkitaan ongelmaa luoda todennäköisesti kyselyjä multimodaalisille asiakirjoille, joissa on kuvia. Sovellusskenaariomme mahdollistaa asiaankuuluvien dokumenttien "ensimmäisen vaiheen haun" liittämällä luodut kyselyt dokumentteihin ennen indeksointia. Tämän jälkeen voimme indeksoida laajennetun tekstin, jotta voimme tehokkaasti rajata ehdokasotteluihin käänteisen indeksin avulla, jotta kallista uudelleenjärjestelyä voidaan seurata. Arviointituloksemme osoittavat, että ehdotettu multimodaaliedustus parantaa merkitsevästi relevanssia. Tärkeintä on, että viitekehyksemme voi saavuttaa huipputason ensimmäisen vaiheen etsintäskenaarioissa.', 'af': "Hierdie papier leer die probleem om waarskynlik vrae te genereer vir multimodale dokumente met beelde. Ons toepassingsscenario is toepaslik 'eerste stadige ontvang' van relevante doc- dokumente, deur gegenereerde navraage aan doc- dokumente aanheg voor indeksering. Ons kan dan indeks sy uitgevoude teks om effektief na kandidate ooreenstemmende onder te druk deur omgekeerde indeks te gebruik, sodat koste heranking kan volg. Ons evaluasie-resultate wys dat ons voorgestelde multimodale voorstelling betekenlik verbeter die levensranging. Nog belangrik kan ons raamwerk die staat van die kuns in die eerste stadige herhaal scenarios bereik", 'ca': "Aquest paper estudia el problema de generar preguntes per documents multimodals amb imatges. El nostre escenari d'aplicació permet la recuperació eficientdels documentos pertinents en primera etapa, afegint les preguntes generades als documentos abans de l'índex. Llavors podem indexar aquest text expandit per reduir-nos eficientmenta les partides candidates fent servir índex invertit, així que els costosos reenvolupaments puguin seguir. Els nostres resultats d'evaluació demostren que la nostra representació multi modal proposada millora significativament la classificació de pertinença. More importantly, ourframework can achieve the state of the art inthe first stage retrieval scenarios", 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop Aplikasi sing perusahaan iso nglanggar \'first-phase intake\' karo bebasan dokumen, dadi nglanggar aturan popis kanggo dokumen-dokumen tualke indekser. text-editor-action Rejection Awak dhéwé, akeh gunggo iso nggawe Stad kanggo seni nang sekanan sing berarti', 'ha': "Wannan karatun na karanta matsalar masu iya samun tambayi masu yiwuwa wa masu iya samun takardar multi-dokumen aiki da zane. @ info Za iya iya lokacin da ake faɗa matsayinsa dõmin mu saka mai sauƙi zuwa kandidajiya masu motsi da za'a yi amfani da index-tarawa, da haka yana iya biyar. MatamayinMu na ƙiyayi yana nũna cẽwa, shirinmu da aka buƙata misalin multi-modal, yana da muhimmin improve daraja. Ki muhimu, firam masu iya sãmun halin sanar na kwanza", 'he': 'הנייר הזה לומד את הבעיה של מיוצר שאלות למסמכים רבים עם תמונות. תרחיש היישומים שלנו מאפשר "השיגה בשלב הראשון" היעילה של מסמכים רלוונטיים, על ידי הקשור שאלות יוצרות למסמכים לפני מידע. אנו יכולים לאחר מכן לתקן את הטקסט המורחב הזה כדי לצמצם באופן יעיל לתאמות מועמדים באמצעות אינדיקס מופך, כך שיכול לעקוב אחריו מחדש הקשר יקר. Our eval-uation results show that our proposed multi-modal representation meaningfully improvesrelevance ranking. יותר חשוב, המסגרת שלנו יכולה להשיג את המצב של האמנות בתסריטי החזרה בשלב הראשון', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek proučuje problem ustvarjanja verjetnih poizvedb za multimodalne dokumente s slikami. Naš scenarij aplikacije omogoča učinkovito "prvo stopnjo pridobivanja" ustreznih dokumentov, tako da pred indeksiranjem dodajamo ustvarjene poizvedbe dokumentom. Nato lahko to razširjeno besedilo indeksiramo in učinkovito omejimo na tekme kandidatov z uporabo obrnjenega indeksa, tako da lahko sledi drago ponovno razvrščanje. Rezultati ocenjevanja kažejo, da naša predlagana multimodalna reprezentacija pomembno izboljšuje razvrstitev ustreznosti. Še pomembneje, naš okvir lahko doseže stanje tehnike v prvi fazi scenarijev iskanja', 'bo': "ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་བློ་གཏོང་མས་སྣ་མང་ཆོས་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་དུ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང Our application scenario is enablingefficient 'first-stage retrieval' of relevant doc-uments, by attaching generated queries to doc-uments before indexing. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་གནད་སྡུད་མི་གྲངས་སུ་མཐོང་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཐབས་རྩོམ་པ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་འཆར་བར་གནས ཧ་ཅང་གལ་ཆེན་ཤུགས་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་གཞུང་གིས་སྒྱུ་རྩལ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལྟར་འཛུགས་ཐུབ་པ་ལས།"}
{'en': 'End-to-End Argument Mining as Biaffine Dependency Parsing', 'ar': 'تعدين الحجة من طرف إلى طرف مثل تحليل تبعية بيافين', 'es': 'Minería de argumentos de extremo a extremo como análisis de dependencias biafín', 'pt': 'Mineração de argumentos de ponta a ponta como análise de dependência biaffine', 'fr': "Exploration d'arguments de bout en bout comme analyse de dépendance biaffine", 'ja': 'Biaffine依存関係解析としてのエンドツーエンドの引数マイニング', 'hi': 'Biaffine निर्भरता पार्सिंग के रूप में एंड-टू-एंड तर्क खनन', 'zh': '端到端参数掘为双affine赖以解析', 'ru': 'Сквозной майнинг аргументов как разбор биаффиновых зависимостей', 'ga': 'Mianadóireacht Argóin ó cheann ceann go ceann mar Pharsáil Spleáchais Bhiaifín', 'ka': 'ბოლოდან დასრულებული აპდუმენტის მინიღება როგორც Biaffine dependency Parsing', 'hu': 'Végtől-végig érvelt bányászat mint biaffin függőség értelmezése', 'el': 'Ολοκληρωμένη εξόρυξη επιχειρημάτων ως ανάλυση εξάρτησης από Biaffine', 'kk': 'Аргументтің аяқтау- аяқтау аргументтің бағалау үшін екефон тәуелдік талдау', 'it': "L'estrazione di argomenti end-to-end come analisi della dipendenza della biaffina", 'lt': 'Argument ų gavyba nuo galo iki galo kaip biffino priklausomybės analizė', 'mk': 'Работење на аргументи од крај до крај како анализирање на зависноста од биафин', 'ml': 'അവസാന- മുതല്\u200d അവസാനിക്കുന്ന അര്\u200dഗമെന്റ് മൈനിംഗ് ബിയാഫിന്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന പാര്\u200dസിങ്', 'ms': 'Menyembah Argumen Akhir-Akhir sebagai Penghuraian Dependensi Biaffine', 'mt': 'Tħaffir ta’ Argumenti minn Tmiem sa Tmiem bħala Parsaġġ tad-Dipendenza tal-Biaffina', 'no': 'Slutt- til- sluttargumentmining som tolking av avhengighet', 'pl': 'End-to-End wydobywanie argumentów jako analiza zależności biafiny', 'ro': 'Minerirea argumentelor end-to-end ca analizare a dependenței de biafine', 'sr': 'Miniranje argumenta do kraja kao razmatranje zavisnosti Biafina', 'so': 'Xiriirka ugu dhamaadka dhamaadka ee dhamaadka ah', 'si': 'අවසානයෙන් අවසානය වාර්තාව මනින් විසින් බියාෆින් විශේෂතාවක් විසින්න', 'sv': 'End-to-End Argument Mining as Biaffine Dependency Parsing', 'mn': 'Аргументийн төгсгөл-төгсгөл багасгал Биафин хамааралын талаар', 'ta': 'பையாபின் சார்ந்த சார்ந்த பாடலாக முடிவுக்கு முடிவு', 'ur': 'آخر-to-end Argument Mining as Biaffine Dependency Parsing', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Bộ khai quật cuối cùng là thuộc phụ thuộc Biffine', 'da': 'End-to-End Argument Mining som Biaffine Dependency Parsing', 'bg': 'Добиване на аргументи от край до край като анализ на зависимостта на биафините', 'hr': 'Miniranje argumenta za kraj do kraja kao razmatranje zavisnosti Biafina', 'nl': 'End-to-End Argument Mining als Biaffine Dependency Parsing', 'id': 'Penyembahan Argumen Akhir-Akhir sebagai Penganalisan Dependensi Biaffine', 'de': 'End-to-End Argument Mining als Biaffine Dependency Parsing', 'fa': 'پایان به پایان آرژومین به عنوان تولید بستگی بیافین', 'sw': 'End-to-End Argument Mining as Biaffine Dependency Parsing', 'ko': '끝에서 끝까지 매개 변수 발굴을 이중 모방 의존항으로 분석', 'af': 'End- to- End Argument Mining as Biaffine Dependency Parsing', 'tr': 'Argument Ahyry Baýlamak Baýlamak Beýikliki Parlamak', 'hy': 'Բիաֆինի կախվածության վերջնական և վերջնական հանքարում', 'sq': 'Minimi i argumenteve nga fundi në fund si analizim i varësisë së Biaffinit', 'am': 'End-to-End Argument Mining as Biaffine Dependency Parsing', 'az': 'Bütün bağlılıq bağlılığı Parılması olaraq son-to-end Argument Mining', 'bs': 'Miniranje argumenta za kraj do kraja kao razmatranje zavisnosti Biafina', 'bn': 'বায়াফিন নির্ভরশীল পার্সিং হিসেবে শেষ- থেকে শেষ করা আর্গুমেন্ট মাইনিং', 'ca': 'Fin a Fin Argument Mining com a analització de dependencies de Biaffine', 'cs': 'End-to-End argument Mining jako analýza závislosti na biffinu', 'et': 'Lõpp-lõpuni argumentide kaevandamine kui biaffini sõltuvuse parsimine', 'fi': 'End-to-End Argumentin louhinta Biaffine Dependency Parsing', 'jv': 'End-to-End argument Minng as Biffine dependance Parasing', 'sk': 'Argumentno rudarjenje od konca do konca kot analiziranje odvisnosti biafinov', 'ha': 'QDialogButtonBox', 'he': 'מכירת טיעון בסוף עד הסוף בתור בדיקת תלויות ביאפין', 'bo': 'End-to-End Argument Mining as Biaffine Dependency Parsing'}
{'en': 'Non-neural approaches to argument mining (AM) are often pipelined and require heavy feature-engineering. In this paper, we propose a neural end-to-end approach to AM which is based on dependency parsing, in contrast to the current state-of-the-art which relies on relation extraction. Our biaffine AM dependency parser significantly outperforms the state-of-the-art, performing at F1 = 73.5 % for component identification and F1 = 46.4 % for relation identification. One of the advantages of treating AM as biaffine dependency parsing is the simple neural architecture that results. The idea of treating AM as dependency parsing is not new, but has previously been abandoned as it was lagging far behind the state-of-the-art. In a thorough analysis, we investigate the factors that contribute to the success of our model : the biaffine model itself, our representation for the dependency structure of arguments, different encoders in the biaffine model, and syntactic information additionally fed to the model. Our work demonstrates that dependency parsing for AM, an overlooked idea from the past, deserves more attention in the future.', 'ar': 'غالبًا ما تكون المناهج غير العصبية لتعدين الجدل (AM) مخططة وتتطلب هندسة ميزات ثقيلة. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نهجًا عصبيًا من طرف إلى طرف لـ AM والذي يعتمد على تحليل التبعية ، على عكس الحالة الحالية التي تعتمد على استخراج العلاقة. يتفوق محلل تبعية biaffine AM الخاص بنا بشكل كبير على أحدث التقنيات ، حيث يعمل عند F1 = 73.5٪ لتحديد المكون و F1 = 46.4٪ لتحديد العلاقة. واحدة من مزايا معاملة AM كتحليل تبعية biaffine هي البنية العصبية البسيطة التي تنتج. إن فكرة التعامل مع AM على أنها تحليل تبعية ليست جديدة ، ولكن تم التخلي عنها سابقًا لأنها كانت متخلفة كثيرًا عن أحدث التقنيات. في تحليل شامل ، نحقق في العوامل التي تساهم في نجاح نموذجنا: نموذج بيافين نفسه ، وتمثيلنا لهيكل التبعية للحجج ، والمشفرات المختلفة في نموذج بيافيني ، والمعلومات النحوية التي يتم تغذيتها بشكل إضافي إلى النموذج. يوضح عملنا أن تحليل التبعية لـ AM ، وهي فكرة تم التغاضي عنها من الماضي ، تستحق المزيد من الاهتمام في المستقبل.', 'fr': "Les approches non neuronales de l'exploration d'arguments (AM) sont souvent canalisées et nécessitent une ingénierie complexe des caractéristiques. Dans cet article, nous proposons une approche neuronale de bout en bout de la FA basée sur l'analyse des dépendances, contrairement à l'état actuel de la technique qui repose sur l'extraction de relations. Notre analyseur de dépendance AM biaffine surpasse largement les performances de pointe, avec des performances F1 = 73,5\xa0% pour l'identification des composants et F1 = 46,4\xa0% pour l'identification des relations. L'un des avantages de traiter la MA comme une analyse de dépendance à la biaffine est la simplicité de l'architecture neuronale qui en résulte. L'idée de traiter la FA comme une analyse de dépendance n'est pas nouvelle, mais a déjà été abandonnée car elle était loin derrière la technologie de pointe. Dans le cadre d'une analyse approfondie, nous étudions les facteurs qui contribuent au succès de notre modèle\xa0: le modèle biaffine lui-même, notre représentation de la structure de dépendance des arguments, les différents encodeurs dans le modèle biaffine et les informations syntaxiques supplémentaires fournies au modèle. Nos travaux démontrent que l'analyse des dépendances pour la FA, une idée oubliée par le passé, mérite plus d'attention à l'avenir.", 'pt': 'Abordagens não neurais para mineração de argumentos (AM) geralmente são canalizadas e exigem engenharia de recursos pesada. Neste artigo, propomos uma abordagem neural ponta a ponta para AM que é baseada na análise de dependência, em contraste com o estado da arte atual que se baseia na extração de relações. Nosso analisador de dependência AM biffine supera significativamente o estado da arte, apresentando F1 = 73,5% para identificação de componentes e F1 = 46,4% para identificação de relações. Uma das vantagens de tratar AM como análise de dependência biaffine é a arquitetura neural simples que resulta. A ideia de tratar AM como análise de dependência não é nova, mas foi abandonada anteriormente, pois estava muito atrasada em relação ao estado da arte. Em uma análise minuciosa, investigamos os fatores que contribuem para o sucesso do nosso modelo: o próprio modelo biaffine, nossa representação para a estrutura de dependência de argumentos, diferentes codificadores no modelo biaffine e informações sintáticas alimentadas adicionalmente ao modelo. Nosso trabalho demonstra que a análise de dependência para AM, uma ideia negligenciada do passado, merece mais atenção no futuro.', 'es': 'Los enfoques no neuronales para la minería de argumentos (AM) a menudo están canalizados y requieren una gran ingeniería de características. En este artículo, proponemos un enfoque neuronal de extremo a extremo para la AM que se basa en el análisis de dependencias, en contraste con el estado actual de la técnica que se basa en la extracción de relaciones. Nuestro analizador de dependencias de AM biafín supera significativamente al estado de la técnica, con un rendimiento de F1 = 73,5% para la identificación de componentes y F1 = 46,4% para la identificación de relaciones. Una de las ventajas de tratar la AM como análisis de dependencia biafina es la arquitectura neuronal simple que resulta. La idea de tratar la AM como análisis de dependencias no es nueva, pero se ha abandonado anteriormente porque estaba muy por detrás del estado de la técnica. En un análisis exhaustivo, investigamos los factores que contribuyen al éxito de nuestro modelo: el modelo biafín en sí, nuestra representación para la estructura de dependencias de los argumentos, los diferentes codificadores en el modelo biafín y la información sintáctica que se alimenta adicionalmente al modelo. Nuestro trabajo demuestra que el análisis de dependencias para AM, una idea pasada por alto del pasado, merece más atención en el futuro.', 'ja': '引数マイニング（ AM ）への非神経的アプローチは、多くの場合パイプライン化されており、重い機能工学を必要とする。 本稿では、関係抽出に依存する現在の最先端とは対照的に、依存解析に基づくAMへのニューラルエンドツーエンドのアプローチを提案する。 当社のバイアフィンAM依存性パーサーは、最先端のパフォーマンスを大幅に上回り、コンポーネント識別ではF 1 = 73.5%、リレーションシップ識別ではF 1 = 46.4%のパフォーマンスを発揮します。 Ａ Ｍをバイアフィン依存性解析として扱う利点の１つは、結果として生じる単純なニューラルアーキテクチャである。 AMを依存関係解析として扱うアイデアは新しいものではありませんが、最先端のものよりもはるかに遅れていたため、以前は放棄されていました。 徹底的な分析では、私たちのモデルの成功に貢献する要因を調査します。biaffineモデル自体、引数の依存構造の表現、biaffineモデル内の異なるエンコーダ、およびモデルに追加的にフィードされる構文情報です。 私たちの研究は、過去から見落とされてきたアイデアであるAMの依存関係解析が今後もっと注目されるべきであることを示しています。', 'hi': 'तर्क खनन (एएम) के लिए गैर-तंत्रिका दृष्टिकोण अक्सर पाइपलाइन किए जाते हैं और भारी सुविधा-इंजीनियरिंग की आवश्यकता होती है। इस पेपर में, हम एएम के लिए एक तंत्रिका अंत-से-अंत दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो निर्भरता पार्सिंग पर आधारित है, वर्तमान राज्य-कला के विपरीत जो संबंध निष्कर्षण पर निर्भर करता है। हमारे biaffine AM निर्भरता पार्सर काफी अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन, F1 = घटक पहचान के लिए 73.5% और F1 = संबंध पहचान के लिए 46.4% पर प्रदर्शन बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है। एएम को बायफिन निर्भरता पार्सिंग के रूप में इलाज करने के फायदों में से एक सरल तंत्रिका वास्तुकला है जो परिणाम देती है। एएम को निर्भरता पार्सिंग के रूप में मानने का विचार नया नहीं है, लेकिन पहले इसे छोड़ दिया गया है क्योंकि यह अत्याधुनिक से बहुत पीछे था। एक गहन विश्लेषण में, हम उन कारकों की जांच करते हैं जो हमारे मॉडल की सफलता में योगदान करते हैं: biaffine मॉडल ही, तर्कों की निर्भरता संरचना के लिए हमारा प्रतिनिधित्व, biaffine मॉडल में विभिन्न encoders, और वाक्यात्मक जानकारी अतिरिक्त रूप से मॉडल को खिलाया जाता है। हमारा काम दर्शाता है कि एएम के लिए निर्भरता पार्सिंग, अतीत से एक अनदेखी विचार, भविष्य में अधिक ध्यान देने योग्य है।', 'ru': 'Ненейронные подходы к аргументационному майнингу (АП) часто конвейерны и требуют тяжелой функциональной инженерии. В этой статье мы предлагаем нейронный сквозной подход к АП, который основан на синтаксическом разборе зависимостей, в отличие от современного, который опирается на извлечение отношений. Наш биаффинный анализатор зависимостей AM значительно превосходит современный, работая при F1 = 73,5% для идентификации компонентов и F1 = 46,4% для идентификации отношений. Одним из преимуществ обращения с АП как с биаффиновым синтаксическим анализом зависимостей является простая нейронная архитектура, которая приводит к этому. Идея рассматривать АП как синтаксический анализ зависимостей не нова, но ранее от нее отказывались, поскольку она значительно отставала от современного. В тщательном анализе мы исследуем факторы, которые способствуют успеху нашей модели: саму биаффиновую модель, наше представление для структуры зависимостей аргументов, различные кодировщики в биаффиновой модели и синтаксическую информацию, дополнительно подаваемую в модель. Наша работа показывает, что синтаксический анализ зависимостей для АП, упущенная из виду идея из прошлого, заслуживает большего внимания в будущем.', 'zh': '参数掘(AM)非神经常为管道式,大须征役。 本文中,立一基于恃解析之AM神经端到,与目前所恃最新术成鲜明对比。 吾党偏置式AM赖解析器明优于先进,组件识为F1 = 73.5%,于知为F1 = 46.4%。 以AM为双字母恃解析之善,其一由此生神经结构。 以AM为恃解析之心不新,而前已弃之,以其远后于先进之术也。 论其成功之因:双失真模之身,参数恃结构之表,双失真之异编码器及额外给其语法信。 吾事明,AM之依赖性解析,昔之被忽视心,将来可复关也。', 'ga': 'Is minic a chuirtear cineálacha cur chuige neamhnéaracha i leith mianadóireacht argóinte (AM) i bhfeidhm agus éilíonn siad gné-innealtóireacht throm. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid cur chuige néarúil ceann go ceann maidir le AM atá bunaithe ar pharsáil spleáchais, i gcodarsnacht leis an staid reatha atá ag brath ar eastóscadh gaol. Is fearr go mór ár parsálaí spleáchais biafine AM ná an stát-de-aimseartha, ag feidhmiú ag F1 = 73.5% maidir le sainaithint comhpháirteanna agus F1 = 46.4% maidir le sainaithint caidrimh. Ceann de na buntáistí a bhaineann le cóireáil a dhéanamh ar AM mar pharsáil spleáchais biaifín ná an ailtireacht shimplí néarúil a eascraíonn as. Ní rud nua é an smaoineamh chun AM a chóireáil mar pharsáil spleáchais, ach tá sé tréigthe roimhe seo toisc go raibh sé tite i bhfad chun deiridh ar an stát nua-aimseartha. In anailís chríochnúil, déanaimid imscrúdú ar na fachtóirí a chuireann le rathúlacht ár múnla: an tsamhail biaifín féin, ár n-ionadaíocht do struchtúr spleáchais na n-argóintí, ionchódóirí éagsúla sa mhúnla biaifín, agus faisnéis chomhréire a chuirtear leis an tsamhail freisin. Léiríonn ár gcuid oibre go bhfuil níos mó airde tuillte sa todhchaí ag parsáil spleáchais le haghaidh AM, smaoineamh nach rabhthas ag súil leis ón am atá thart.', 'el': 'Οι μη νευρωνικές προσεγγίσεις στην εξόρυξη επιχειρημάτων (ΑΜ) συχνά έχουν διοχετευθεί και απαιτούν βαριά μηχανική χαρακτηριστικών. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια νευρωνική προσέγγιση της ΑΜ που βασίζεται στην ανάλυση εξάρτησης, σε αντίθεση με την τρέχουσα κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας που βασίζεται στην εξαγωγή σχέσεων. Ο αναλυτής εξάρτησης από τη διφινίνη μας ξεπερνά σημαντικά την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας, αποδίδοντας σε F1,73,5% για τον προσδιορισμό συστατικών και F1,46,4% για τον προσδιορισμό σχέσεων. Ένα από τα πλεονεκτήματα της αντιμετώπισης της ΑΜ ως ανάλυσης εξάρτησης από biaffine είναι η απλή νευρική αρχιτεκτονική που προκύπτει. Η ιδέα της αντιμετώπισης της ΑΜ ως ανάλυσης εξάρτησης δεν είναι νέα, αλλά έχει εγκαταλειφθεί προηγουμένως καθώς υστερεί πολύ πίσω από την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας. Σε μια εμπεριστατωμένη ανάλυση, διερευνούμε τους παράγοντες που συμβάλλουν στην επιτυχία του μοντέλου μας: το ίδιο το μοντέλο διαφίνης, η αναπαράσταση μας για τη δομή εξάρτησης των ορίων, διαφορετικοί κωδικοποιητές στο μοντέλο διαφίνης και συντακτικές πληροφορίες που τροφοδοτούνται επιπλέον στο μοντέλο. Η εργασία μας δείχνει ότι η ανάλυση εξάρτησης για την ΑΜ, μια ιδέα που παραβλέπεται από το παρελθόν, αξίζει περισσότερη προσοχή στο μέλλον.', 'hu': 'Az argumentumbányászat (AM) nem neurális megközelítései gyakran csővezetékes és nehéz funkciótervezést igényelnek. Ebben a tanulmányban az AM neurális end-to-end megközelítését javasoljuk, amely függőség elemzésén alapul, ellentétben a jelenlegi, relatív extrakción alapuló korszerűséggel. A biaffin AM függőség elemzőnk jelentősen felülmúlja a legkorszerűbb teljesítményt, F1 = 73,5%, F1 = 46,4% a kapcsolat azonosítása esetén. Az AM biaffin függőség elemzéseként való kezelésének egyik előnye az egyszerű neurális architektúra. Az a gondolat, hogy az AM-t függőség-elemzésként kezeljük, nem új, de korábban elhagytuk, mivel messze elmaradt a korszerűség mögött. Alapos elemzésben megvizsgáljuk azokat a tényezőket, amelyek hozzájárulnak a modellünk sikeréhez: magát a biaffin modellt, az argumentumok függőségi struktúrájának reprezentációját, a biaffin modellben különböző kódolókat és a modellhez továbbított szintaktikus információkat. Munkánk bizonyítja, hogy az AM függőség elemzése, amely a múltból származó elképzelés, a jövőben nagyobb figyelmet érdemel.', 'ka': 'არსებული ნეიროლური მიღებები არსებულ მიღებაზე (AM) უფრო უფრო გარგებულია და უნდა გარგება ძალიან ფუნქციური ინეზინერია. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მინდომით ნეიროლური დასრულებული დასრულებული მიზეზი AM-ზე, რომელიც დააყენებული დასრულებულობის პარაქტირების დაბაზეულია, რომელიც მიმდინარე ხელსაწყოთა მდგომარეობის ჩვენი biaffine AM დამხოლოების პანელიზატორია მნიშვნელოვანია, რომელიც F1 = 73,5% მონაცემებისთვის და F1 = 46,4% მონაცემებისთვის. AM-ს გასაღების ერთი გამოსახულება, როგორც ბიფინის დასახულებელობის პარასტირება, არის ერთადერთი ნეიროლური აქტიქტირება, რომელიც წარმოდგენა. AM-ს გადაწყვეტილების იდეა, როგორც დაახლოების გადაწყვეტილება არ არის ახალი, მაგრამ წინაც გადატოვებულია, როგორც იყო მსოფლიოს სახელის გადარჩენა. სრულ ანალიზაციაში, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ ფაქტორები, რომელიც ჩვენი მოდელის წარმატებისთვის დამატებული მოდელის წარმატებისთვის: ბიფინის მოდელის თავიდან, ჩვენი განსახულება არგუმენტების განსახულებელობის სტრუქტურაციის, განსხვ ჩვენი სამუშაო დემონსტრაცია, რომ სამუშაოდ დასაწყებელობა სამუშაოდ, სამუშაოდ სამუშაოდ იდეა, სამუშაოდ უფრო დაახლოებით მომავალ', 'it': "Gli approcci non neurali al argument mining (AM) sono spesso pipelined e richiedono una pesante feature-engineering. In questo articolo, proponiamo un approccio neurale end-to-end all'AM basato sull'analisi delle dipendenze, in contrasto con l'attuale stato dell'arte che si basa sull'estrazione delle relazioni. Il nostro analizzatore di dipendenze AM biaffine supera significativamente lo stato dell'arte, performando a F1 = 73,5% per l'identificazione dei componenti e F1 = 46,4% per l'identificazione delle relazioni. Uno dei vantaggi di trattare AM come analisi delle dipendenze biaffine è la semplice architettura neurale che ne risulta. L'idea di trattare AM come analisi delle dipendenze non è nuova, ma è stata precedentemente abbandonata in quanto era molto indietro rispetto allo stato dell'arte. In un'analisi approfondita, esaminiamo i fattori che contribuiscono al successo del nostro modello: il modello biaffina stesso, la nostra rappresentazione per la struttura di dipendenza degli argomenti, diversi encoder nel modello biaffina e informazioni sintattiche alimentate ulteriormente al modello. Il nostro lavoro dimostra che l'analisi delle dipendenze per AM, un'idea trascurata dal passato, merita più attenzione in futuro.", 'kk': 'Невралдық емес аргументтің бағыттауы (AM) көбінесе қатты қасиеттер инженерлігін талап етеді. Бұл қағазда, біз AM-нің невралдық аяқтау тәуелдік талдауына негізделген невралдық аяқтау тәсілдігін ұсынамыз. Бұл қағаздың аяқтау тәуелдік талдауына негізделген невралдық аяқтау күйіне қарс Біздің biaffine AM тәуелсіздік талдаушысыз, F1 = 73,5% компоненттің идентификациясы үшін жұмыс істейтін, F1 = 46,4% істейтін. AM-ды биафин тәуелсіздік талдау ретінде қарапайым невралдық архитектурасының бірі. AM тәуелдік талдауы ретінде тәуелдік талдау идеясы жаңа емес, бірақ алдында ол әртүрлік күйінің артында қалды. Біз өзіміздің үлгіміздің сәттілігіне көмектесетін факторларды зерттейміз: биафин үлгісі өзіміз, аргументтердің тәуелдік құрылымыз, биафин моделінің түрлі кодерлері және синтактикалық мәліметтері үлгісіне қосылған Біздің жұмысымыздың ТМ үшін тәуелсіздік талдау, өткен идеяның алдындағы көбірек болашақта тәуелсіздігін көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Nenerviniai požiūriai į argument ų gavybą (angl. Šiame dokumente mes siūlome nervinį požiūrį į AM, kuris grindžiamas priklausomybės analize, priešingai nei dabartinė pažanga, kuri grindžiama santykių išgavimu. Our biaffine AM dependency parser significantly outperforms the state-of-the-art, performing at F1 = 73.5% for component identification and F1 = 46.4% for relation identification.  Vienas iš pranašumų vertinant AM kaip priklausomybės nuo biffino analizę yra paprasta, rezultatuojanti neurologinė architektūra. Mąstymas laikyti AM priklausomybės analizavimu nėra naujas, bet anksčiau buvo paliktas, nes jis buvo labai atsiliekantis nuo naujausios pažangos. Atlikus išsamią analizę, tiriame veiksnius, kurie prisideda prie mūsų modelio sėkmės: paties bifino modelio, mūsų atstovavimas argumentų priklausomybės struktūrai, skirtingi bifino modelio kodai ir papildomai prie modelio pridėta sintaktinė informacija. Mūsų darbas rodo, kad ateityje labiau dėmesio reikia skirti priklausomybės analizei AM – praeities pamirštai idėjai.', 'ms': 'Non-neural approaches to argument mining (AM) are often pipelined and require heavy feature-engineering.  Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan pendekatan saraf akhir-akhir ke AM yang berdasarkan penghuraian dependensi, berbeza dengan keadaan-keadaan semasa yang bergantung pada ekstraksi hubungan. Penghurai dependensi AM biaffin kita secara signifikan melebihi state-of-the-art, melaksanakan pada F1 = 73.5% untuk pengenalan komponen dan F1 = 46.4% untuk pengenalan hubungan. Salah satu keuntungan memperlakukan AM sebagai penghuraian dependensi biaffin adalah arkitektur saraf sederhana yang menghasilkan. Idea memperlakukan AM sebagai penghuraian dependensi bukanlah baru, tetapi sebelumnya telah ditinggalkan kerana ia tertinggal jauh di belakang state-of-the-art. Dalam analisis yang teliti, kami menyelidiki faktor yang menyumbang kepada kejayaan model kami: model biaffin sendiri, mewakili kami untuk struktur dependensi argumen, pengekod berbeza dalam model biaffin, dan maklumat sintaktik tambahan diberi kepada model. Kerja kita menunjukkan bahawa penghuraian dependensi untuk AM, idea yang terlepas dari masa lalu, layak mendapat lebih perhatian di masa depan.', 'mt': 'Approċċi mhux newrali għat-tħaffir tal-minjieri (AM) ta’ spiss jiġu mħaddma b’pajpijiet u jeħtieġu inġinerija ta’ karatteristiċi kbar. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu approċċ newrali minn tarf għal tarf għall-AM li huwa bbażat fuq l-analiżi tad-dipendenza, b’kuntrast mal-istat attwali tal-a ħħar li jiddependi fuq l-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet. Il-analizzatur tad-dipendenza tal-AM biffin tagħna huwa sinifikattivament ogħla mill-aktar avvanzat, li jwettaq il-prestazzjoni f’F1 = 73.5% għall-identifikazzjoni tal-komponent u F1 = 46.4% għall-identifikazzjoni tar-relazzjoni. Waħda mill-vantaġġi tat-trattament tal-AM bħala analiżi tad-dipendenza biffina hija l-arkitettura newrali sempliċi li tirriżulta. L-idea li l-AM jiġi ttrattat bħala analiżi tad-dipendenza mhijiex ġdida, iżda preċedentement ġiet abbandunata peress li kienet lura ħafna wara l-aħħar. F’analiżi bir-reqqa, ninvestigaw il-fatturi li jikkontribwixxu għas-suċċess tal-mudell tagħna: il-mudell biaffin innifsu, ir-rappreżentanza tagħna għall-istruttura tad-dipendenza tal-argumenti, kodifikaturi differenti fil-mudell biaffin, u informazzjoni sintattika li tingħata addizzjonalment lill-mudell. Ix-xogħol tagħna juri li l-analiżi tad-dipendenza għall-AM, idea injorata mill-passat, jistħoqqilha aktar attenzjoni fil-futur.', 'mk': 'Неневралните пристапи кон рударството на аргументи (АМ) честопати се наоѓаат во гасоводот и бараат тешка инженерија. Во овој весник предложуваме нервен пристап кон АМ кој е базиран на анализирање на зависноста, во спротивност на сегашната техничка состојба која зависи од екстракција на односите. Нашиот биафински анализатор на зависност од АМ значително го надминува најдоброто, изведувајќи се на F1 = 73,5 отсто за идентификација на компонентите и F1 = 46,4 отсто за идентификација на односите. Една од предностите од третирањето на АМ како анализирање на зависноста од биафините е едноставната нервна архитектура која резултира. Идејата за третирање на АМ како анализирање на зависноста не е нова, туку претходно беше напуштена бидејќи таа останува далеку зад техничката состојба. Во темелна анализа, ги истражуваме факторите кои придонесуваат за успехот на нашиот модел: самиот биафински модел, нашата претстава за структурата на зависноста на аргументите, различните кодери во биафинскиот модел, и синтактичките информации додатно дадени на моделот. Нашата работа покажува дека анализирањето на зависноста за AM, заборавена идеја од минатото, заслужува поголемо внимание во иднина.', 'mn': 'Аргументийн хөрөнгө оруулах (АМ) аргументын тулд мэдрэлийн бус ойлголт ихэвчлэн хоолойн хөрөнгө оруулж, маш хүндрэлтэй инженер хэрэгтэй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид АМ-ийн мэдрэлийн төгсгөлд хамааралтай хуваалцааны үндсэн сэтгэл хөдлөлийг санал болгож байна. Харин одоогийн урлагийн үйл явдал нь хамааралтай хамааралтай. Бидний биефин АМ-ын хамааралтай хуваагч нь урлагийн хувьд илүү чухал байдал хийдэг. F1 = 73.5% нь компонентын тодорхойлолтын хувьд, F1 = 46.4% нь харилцааны тодорхойлолтын хувьд. АМ-г биефин хамааралтай хуваалцааны тухай эмчилгээний нэг тал нь энгийн мэдрэлийн архитектур юм. АМ-г хамааралтай хуваалцлага гэж үзэх санаа нь шинэ биш, гэхдээ өмнө нь урлагийн хувьд уран зориулалтын ард үлдсэн учраас халдвар алга болсон. Тодорхой шинжилгээнд бид загварын амжилтын тулд нөлөөлдөг хүчин зүйлсийг судалж, биефин загвар өөрөө, бидний аргументын хамааралтай байдлын бүтэц, биефин загварын өөр өөр коддогчид, синтактик мэдээллийг загвар руу нэмэгдүүлсэн. Бидний ажил АМ-ын хамаарал хамааралтай хуваалцаа, өнгөрсөн санаагаас илүү анхаарлыг илүү төвлөрөх ёстой гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'Nieneuronowe podejścia do wydobywania argumentów (AM) są często wykorzystywane przez rurociągi i wymagają ciężkiej inżynierii funkcji. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy neuronowe podejście end-to-end do AM oparte na parsowaniu zależności, w przeciwieństwie do obecnego stanu techniki, który opiera się na ekstrakcji relacji. Nasz biafinowy parser zależności AM znacznie przewyższa najnowocześniejszy stan techniki, działając w F1,73,5% dla identyfikacji komponentów i F1,46,4% dla identyfikacji relacji. Jedną z zalet traktowania AM jako parsowania zależności biafiny jest prosta architektura neuronowa, która powstaje. Pomysł traktowania AM jako analizy zależności nie jest nowy, ale wcześniej został porzucony, ponieważ pozostaje daleko za najnowocześniejszym stanem techniki. W dokładnej analizie badamy czynniki, które przyczyniają się do sukcesu naszego modelu: sam model biafinowy, nasza reprezentacja struktury zależności argumentów, różne kodery w modelu biafinowym oraz informacje składniowe dodatkowo dostarczane do modelu. Nasza praca pokazuje, że analiza zależności dla AM, pomijana idea z przeszłości, zasługuje na większą uwagę w przyszłości.', 'no': 'Ikkje-neuralnærmingar til argument-mining (AM) er ofte pipelinert og krev kraftig funksjonsengineering. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein neuralt ende-til-slutt tilnærming til AM som er basert på analysering av avhengighet, i contrast til den gjeldande tilstanden av kunsten som dependerer på utpakking av relasjon. Det våre biaffine AM-avhengighetsanalysen utfører betydelig tilstanden til kunsten, som utfører på F1 = 73,5% for komponentsidentifikasjon og F1 = 46,4% for relasjonsidentifikasjon. Ein av fordelene til å behandla AM som tolking av biaffinavhengighet er den enkle neuralarkitekturen som resulterer. Ideen om behandling av AM som tolking av avhengighet er ikkje nytt, men har tidlegare blitt forlatt sidan han lagde langt bak kunsttilstanden. I ein røyd analyse undersøker vi faktorene som bidrar til suksessen av modellen vårt: biaffinmodellen sjølv, vårt representasjon for avhengighetsstrukturen av argumenter, ulike kodarar i biaffinmodellen, og syntaksiske informasjon tillegg fødd til modellen. Arbeidet vårt viser at avhengighetsanalysering for AM, eit oversikt idee frå siste, merir meir oppmerksomhet i framtida.', 'ro': 'Abordările non-neurale ale argumentului mining (AM) sunt adesea conduse și necesită inginerie de caracteristici grele. În această lucrare, propunem o abordare neurală end-to-end a AM care se bazează pe analizarea dependenței, spre deosebire de starea actuală a tehnologiei care se bazează pe extragerea relațiilor. Analizorul nostru de dependență AM biafine depășește semnificativ cele mai moderne performanțe, performând la F1 = 73,5% pentru identificarea componentelor și F1 = 46,4% pentru identificarea relațiilor. Unul dintre avantajele tratării AM ca analizare a dependenței biafine este arhitectura neuronală simplă care rezultă. Ideea de a trata AM ca analizare a dependențelor nu este nouă, dar a fost abandonată anterior, deoarece rămânea mult în urma stadiului de tehnologie. Într-o analiză amănunțită, investigăm factorii care contribuie la succesul modelului nostru: modelul biafină în sine, reprezentarea noastră pentru structura dependenței argumentelor, diferiți codificatori în modelul biafină și informații sintactice alimentate suplimentar modelului. Munca noastră demonstrează că analiza dependenței pentru AM, o idee trecută cu vederea din trecut, merită mai multă atenție în viitor.', 'sr': 'Ne-neuralni pristupi rudarstvu argumenta (AM) često su otvoreni i zahtevaju teški inženjering feature-engineering. U ovom papiru predlažemo neuralni pristup AM-u koji se temelji na analizu zavisnosti, u suprotnosti sa trenutnom stanju umjetnosti koja se oslanja na ekstrakciju odnosa. Naš analizator ovisnosti biafina AM značajno iznosi stanje umjetnosti, koji izvodi na F1 = 73,5% za identifikaciju komponenta i F1 = 46,4% za identifikaciju odnosa. Jedna od prednosti liječenja AM kao analiza ovisnosti biafina je jednostavna neuralna arhitektura koja rezultira. Ideja liječenja AM kao analiza ovisnosti nije nova, ali je ranije napuštena jer je ostavila daleko iza države umjetnosti. U temeljnoj analizi istražujemo faktore koji doprinose uspjehu našeg model a: samog modela biafina, naše zastupanje za strukturu ovisnosti argumentacija, različite kodere u modelu biafina i sintaktične informacije dodatno hranjene modelu. Naš rad pokazuje da razmatranje zavisnosti za AM, pretjerano ideja iz prošlosti zaslužuje više pažnje u budućnosti.', 'sv': 'Icke-neurala metoder för argumentbrytning (AM) är ofta rörledningar och kräver tung funktionsteknik. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en neural end-to-end ansats till AM som bygger på beroendetolkning, i motsats till den nuvarande state-of-the-art som förlitar sig på relationsextraktion. Vår biaffin AM beroendeparser presterar betydligt bättre än den senaste tekniken och presterar vid F1 = 73,5% för komponentidentifiering och F1 = 46,4% för relationidentifiering. En av fördelarna med att behandla AM som biaffinberoendeanalys är den enkla neurala arkitekturen som resulterar. Idén att behandla AM som beroendetolkning är inte ny, men har tidigare övergivits eftersom den låg långt efter den senaste tekniken. I en grundlig analys undersöker vi de faktorer som bidrar till framgången för vår modell: biaffinmodellen själv, vår representation för beroendestrukturen hos argument, olika kodare i biaffinmodellen och syntaktisk information som matas vidare till modellen. Vårt arbete visar att beroendetolkning för AM, en förbisedd idé från det förflutna, förtjänar mer uppmärksamhet i framtiden.', 'ml': 'ആര്\u200dഗ്യുമിനിംഗ് മിനിങ്ങിന്ന് ന്യൂറല്\u200d അല്ലാത്ത സമീപത്തുകള്\u200d എപ്പോഴും പിപ്പിള്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നുണ്ട്. കഠിനമായ പ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നത് ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങിനെ അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ന്യൂറല്\u200d അവസാനത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്താണ നമ്മുടെ ബിഫിന്\u200d AM ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നത് പരാജയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. F1 = 73. 5% പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. സമ്പര്\u200dക്കത്തി എം ചികിത്സിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ഒരു ഉപകാരമാണ് ബിഫിന്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നത് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് എന്നതാണ് അതിന്റെ ഫലം ലളിതമായ പുരു ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങിനെ ചികിത്സിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ആശയം പുതിയതൊന്നുമല്ല, പക്ഷെ മുമ്പ് തന്നെ വിട്ടുപോയിരിക്കുന നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ വിജയത്തില്\u200d സഹായിക്കുന്ന കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. ബിഫിന്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d തന്നെയാണ്, വാദികളുടെ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധിയ Our work demonstrates that dependency parsing for AM, an overlooked idea from the past, deserves more attention in the future.', 'ta': 'Non-neural approaches to argument mining (AM) are often pipelined and require heavy feature-engineering.  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் சார்ந்த பாடலை அடிப்படையில் AM க்கு ஒரு புதிய முடிவு செயல்பாட்டை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். தற்போதைய நிலையில் உள்ள கலை தொ நம்முடைய பியாபின் AM சார்பு பரிசுத்தம் தொடர்பு அடையாளத்திற்காக F1 = 73. 5% செயல்படுத்தும் பொருள் அடையாளம் மற்றும் F1 = 46. 4% ஆகும். AM சிகிச்சை செய்யும் ஒரு பயன்பாடு சார்ந்த சார்பு காட்சி செய்யும் AM யோசனை புதியது அல்ல, ஆனால் முன்பு விட்டு விடப்பட்டுள்ளது ஏனென்றால் அது மாநிலை- கலை பி ஒரு முழுமையான ஆராய்ச்சியில், நாம் எங்கள் மாதிரியின் வெற்றிக்கு பங்கு செய்யும் காரணிகளை ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம்: பைபின் மாதிரி தன்னை தான், வார்ப்புகளின் சார்ந்த அம எங்கள் வேலை காண்பிக்கிறது என்று AM பாடல் சார்ந்தது, கடந்த ஒரு புறக்கணிக்கப்பட்ட யோசனை, எதிர்காலத்தில் அதிக கவனம் தகுதிய', 'ur': 'بغیر نیورال کے مطابق حکومت مینینگ (AM) کی تقریبا اغلبہ پیپی لین کی جاتی ہیں اور بوجھ فرصت انجینژی کی ضرورت کرتی ہیں۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک نیورال انتہائی انتہائی انتہائی طریقہ پیش کریں گے جو نیورال انتہائی انتہائی انتہائی طریقہ پر بنیاد ہے، اس کے مقابلہ میں موجود انتہائی حالت کے مقابلہ میں جو ارتباط انتقام پر اعتماد رکھتا ہے. ہمارے biaffine AM اعتمادی پارچر کو اہم طریقے سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے، F1 = 73.5% پر کامپیوتر شناسایی کے لئے اور F1 = 46.4% رابطہ شناسایی کے لئے. ا م. م. کو بیفن اعتمادی پارسینگ کے طور پر دکھانے کا ایک فائدہ ہے، یہ سادھی نئورل معماری ہے جو نتیجہ پاتی ہے. ایم کی نظر نیوی نہیں ہے لیکن پہلے اس کو چھوڑ دیا گیا تھا جیسے وہ آهنگ کے پیچھے دور رہا تھا. ایک عمدہ تحلیل میں، ہم نے اپنا موڈل کے کامیابی میں اضافہ کرنے والی فاکتوروں کو تحقیق کرلیا ہے: بیفائن موڈل خود، ہمارے معاملات کے اعتباری ساختار کے لئے، بیفائن موڈل میں مختلف انکوڈر اور سینٹکتیک معلومات کو اضافہ کے ساتھ مدل کی گئی ہے. ہمارا کام دکھاتا ہے کہ امر کے لئے اعتباری پارسینٹ، پہلے سے ایک غیر نظریہ ہے، مستقبل میں زیادہ توجه لائق ہے.', 'si': 'Non-neural approach to argment mining (AM) are often tube lined and needed weight Featuring-Engineering. මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා AM වලට නිර්මාණය අවසානයෙන් අවසානය කරනවා, මේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් අවසානය වි අපේ බියාෆින් AM විශ්වාස විශ්වාස කරුණාකරණය විශේෂයෙන් ස්ථිතිය ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා, F1 = 73.5% විශ්වාස කරුණාකරණය සඳහා සම්බන් AM වෙනුවෙන් බියාෆින් විශ්වාස විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තමයි ප්\u200dරතිචාර විශ්වාස කරන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය AM විශ්වාස විශ්වාස විශ්වාස කරන්න අදහසක් අලුත් නෙවෙයි, ඒත් කලින් ඒක අතිරික්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ නැති විදිහට, ඒක ත මුළු විශ්ලේෂණයෙන්, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා අපේ මොඩේල් එකේ සාර්ථක විශ්වාස කරනවා: බියාෆින් මොඩේල් තමයි, අපේ ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සඳහා විශේෂ සංවිධානය සඳ අපේ වැඩේ පෙන්වන්නේ AM වෙනුවෙන් විශ්වාස විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා, අතිතයෙන් අවස්ථාවක් නැති අදහසක්, අනා', 'so': 'Non-neural approaches to argument mining (AM) are often pipelined and require heavy feature-engineering.  Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa habka ugu dambeeya AM oo ku saleysan baarlamaanka ku xiran, si ka duwan xaaladda farshaxanta ah oo ku saabsan soo bixinta xiriirka. Biffine AM dependency Parser ayaa si significant ah u muujiya state-of-the-art, performing at F1 = 73.5% for aqoonsi component and F1 = 46.4% for aqoonsiga xiriirka. Mid ka mid ah faa’iidada daryeelka AM sida baarlamaanka baaritaanka ee biaffin ku filan waa dhismaha neurada ee fudud oo ka soo bixinaya. Fikirada ka baaraandegista AM sida baarlamaanka ku xiran ma aha cusub, laakiin horay waa la dayay, sababtoo ah waxay dib u noqotay xaaladda farshaxanka. Anaalbaarinta si fiican ayaannu ka baaraynaa waxyaabaha ku saabsan liibaanka modellkayaga: modellka baabuurka qudheeda, noocyadayada ku saabsan dhismaha hadallada ku xiran, noocyada kala duduwan ee dabeecada baabuurka, iyo macluumaadka sawirida ee ku saabsan tusaalka. Shuqulkayagu wuxuu muujiyaa in baarlamaanka ku xiran ee AM, fikrada hore laga dhaafay, uu istaahilaa in la sii jeedo mustaqbalka.', 'vi': 'Không-thần kinh tiếp cận khai thác các vấn đề (AM) thường là đường ống và cần thiết thiết tạo đặc trưng nặng. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp kết thúc thần kinh với AM, dựa trên phân tích độ quan hệ phụ thuộc, trái với thời đại hiện nay, dựa trên cách hấp thụ các mối quan hệ. Vị cha phụ thuộc AM của chúng ta khả năng vượt trội hơn trạng thái hiện đại, biểu diễn tại F1=tố73.5=.* cho việc nhận dạng thành phần và F1 =. 46.4=. để nhận dạng mối quan hệ. Một trong những ưu điểm của việc phân tích phụ thuộc AM là đơn giản kiến trúc thần kinh kết quả. Cái ý nghĩ phân tích phụ thuộc AM không phải là mới, nhưng đã bị bỏ rơi khi nó đang tụt lại hậu hậu hậu phương tối tân. Phân tích kỹ lưỡng, chúng tôi nghiên cứu các yếu tố đóng góp cho sự thành công của mô hình: mô hình hai cam kết, sự đại diện cho cấu trúc phụ thuộc của các đối tượng, mã hóa khác nhau trong mô hình hai cam, và thông tin pháp thuật bổ sung cho mô hình. Công việc của chúng ta chứng minh rằng việc phân tích sự lệ thuộc vào AM, một ý tưởng bị bỏ quên từ quá khứ, đáng được chú ý hơn trong tương lai.', 'uz': "Name Bu hujjatda, biz murakkab chiqarishga ishlatadigan tashkilotga qo'shilgan AM asosida bo'lgan neyrol tarkibini rivojlanamiz. Bizning biaffin AM таваккал қилиш параметри муҳим вазият ҳосили кўриб чиқади, F1 = 73.5% компонент аниқлашини ва F1 = 46.4% алоқалар анишиносидан бажарилади. One of the advantages of treating AM as biaffine dependency parsing is the simple neural architecture that results.  AM'ni tasavvur qilish fikrini tasavvur qilish yangi emas, balki avval bu davlat-davlat-davlatning orqali uzoqligi mumkin. Biz modelimizning muvaffaqiyatlariga ega bo'lgan factorilarni qidirib ko'rib chiqaramiz: biaffin modeli o'zimimiz o'zimiz, argumentlarning ishlatuvchi tuzilishimiz, biaffin modelidagi har xil kodlash qoidalarimiz, va modelga qo'shilgan bir xil maʼlumot qoʻshiladi. Bizning ishimiz AM'ning tashkilotlariga ishlatadigan g'oyalarni ko'rsatadi. Oldingi o'ylab qolgan fikr kelajada ko'proq paydo bo'ladi.", 'nl': 'Niet-neurale benaderingen van argument mining (AM) zijn vaak gepipelined en vereisen zware feature-engineering. In dit artikel stellen we een neurale end-to-end benadering van AM voor die gebaseerd is op afhankelijkheidsparsing, in tegenstelling tot de huidige state-of-the-art die gebaseerd is op relatieontwikkeling. Onze biaffine AM afhankelijkheidsparser presteert significant beter dan de state-of-the-art en presteert met F1,73,5% voor component identificatie en F1,46,4% voor relatienidentificatie. Een van de voordelen van het behandelen van AM als biaffine afhankelijkheid parsing is de eenvoudige neurale architectuur die resulteert. Het idee om AM te behandelen als afhankelijkheidsparsing is niet nieuw, maar is eerder verlaten omdat het ver achter de state-of-the-art lag. In een grondige analyse onderzoeken we de factoren die bijdragen aan het succes van ons model: het biaffine model zelf, onze representatie voor de afhankelijkheidsstructuur van argumenten, verschillende encoders in het biaffine model en syntactische informatie die bovendien aan het model wordt gevoed. Ons werk toont aan dat afhankelijkheidsparsing voor AM, een over het hoofd gezien idee uit het verleden, in de toekomst meer aandacht verdient.', 'da': 'Ikke-neurale tilgange til argument mining (AM) er ofte pipelined og kræver tung feature-engineering. I denne artikel foreslår vi en neural end-to-end tilgang til AM, som er baseret på afhængighedsanalyse, i modsætning til den nuværende state-of-the-art, der er afhængig af relation ekstraktion. Vores biaffine AM afhængighedsfortolker overgår væsentligt den nyeste teknologi og yder ved F1 = 73,5% for komponentidentifikation og F1 = 46,4% for relationidentifikation. En af fordelene ved at behandle AM som biaffin afhængighed parsing er den enkle neurale arkitektur, der resulterer. Idéen om at behandle AM som afhængighedsanalyse er ikke ny, men er tidligere blevet opgivet, da den halter langt bagud i den nyeste teknologi. I en grundig analyse undersøger vi de faktorer, der bidrager til vores models succes: selve biaffinmodellen, vores repræsentation for afhængighedsstrukturen af argumenter, forskellige encodere i biaffinmodellen og syntaktisk information, der supplerer modellen. Vores arbejde viser, at afhængighedsanalyse for AM, en overset idé fra fortiden, fortjener mere opmærksomhed i fremtiden.', 'hr': 'Neneurološki pristupi rudarstvu argumentacija (AM) često su otvoreni i zahtijevaju teški inženjering karakteristika. U ovom papiru predlažemo neuralni pristup AM-u koji se temelji na analizu zavisnosti, u suprotnosti s trenutnom stanju umjetnosti koja se oslanja na ekstrakciju odnosa. Naš analitičar ovisnosti biafina AM značajno iznosi stanje umjetnosti, koji izvodi na F1 = 73,5% za identifikaciju komponenta i F1 = 46,4% za identifikaciju odnosa. Jedna od prednosti liječenja AM kao analiza ovisnosti biafina je jednostavna neuralna arhitektura koja rezultira. Ideja liječenja AM kao analiza ovisnosti nije nova, ali je prethodno napuštena jer je ostavila daleko iza države umjetnosti. U temeljnoj analizi istražujemo faktore koji doprinose uspjehu našeg model a: samog modela biafina, naše zastupanje za strukturu ovisnosti argumentacija, različite kodere u modelu biafina i sintaktične informacije dodatno hranjene modelu. Naš rad pokazuje da razmatranje zavisnosti za AM, pretjerano ideja iz prošlosti zaslužuje više pažnje u budućnosti.', 'id': 'pendekatan non-neural untuk argumen pertambangan (AM) sering dipipelin dan memerlukan fitur-insinyur berat. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan pendekatan saraf dari akhir ke akhir ke AM yang berdasarkan pemeriksaan dependensi, dalam perbedaan dengan state-of-the-art saat ini yang bergantung pada ekstraksi hubungan. Analisasi dependensi AM biaffin kami secara signifikan melebihi state-of-the-art, melakukan pada F1 = 73,5% untuk identifikasi komponen dan F1 = 46,4% untuk identifikasi hubungan. One of the advantages of treating AM as biaffine dependency parsing is the simple neural architecture that results.  Ide memperlakukan AM sebagai penghuraian dependensi tidak baru, tetapi sebelumnya telah ditinggalkan karena itu tertinggal jauh di belakang state-of-the-art. Dalam analisis teliti, kami menyelidiki faktor yang berkontribusi untuk sukses model kami: model biaffin sendiri, representation kami untuk struktur dependensi argumen, pengekode berbeda dalam model biaffin, dan informasi sintaksi tambahan diberi kepada model. Pekerjaan kami menunjukkan bahwa penghuraian dependensi untuk AM, ide yang terlepas dari masa lalu, layak mendapat lebih perhatian di masa depan.', 'de': 'Nicht-neuronale Ansätze für Argument Mining (AM) sind oft Pipelined und erfordern ein umfangreiches Feature-Engineering. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir einen neuronalen End-to-End-Ansatz für AM vor, der auf Dependency Parsing basiert, im Gegensatz zum aktuellen Stand der Technik, der auf Relationsextraktion basiert. Unser Biaffin-AM-Abhängigkeitsparser übertrifft signifikant den Stand der Technik und arbeitet mit F1,73,5% für die Bauteilidentifikation und F1,46,4% für die Beziehungsidentifikation. Einer der Vorteile der Behandlung von AM als Biaffinabhängigkeitsparsing ist die einfache neuronale Architektur, die daraus resultiert. Die Idee, AM als Dependency Parsing zu behandeln, ist nicht neu, wurde aber zuvor aufgegeben, da sie weit hinter dem Stand der Technik zurückblieb. In einer gründlichen Analyse untersuchen wir die Faktoren, die zum Erfolg unseres Modells beitragen: das Biaffinmodell selbst, unsere Repräsentation für die Abhängigkeitsstruktur von Argumenten, verschiedene Encoder im Biaffinmodell und syntaktische Informationen, die zusätzlich dem Modell zugeführt werden. Unsere Arbeit zeigt, dass Dependency Parsing für AM, eine übersehene Idee aus der Vergangenheit, in Zukunft mehr Aufmerksamkeit verdient.', 'sw': 'Matokeo yasiyo ya kiserikali yanayohusu uchimbaji wa uchimbaji madini (AM) mara nyingi hupingwa na yanahitaji ubunifu mkubwa. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mbinu ya mwisho wa neura ya AM ambayo in a msingi wa bunge la kutegemea, tofauti na hali ya sanaa inayotegemea utoaji wa mahusiano. Chama chetu kinachotegemea AM kinaonyesha hali ya sanaa, inayofanya kazi katika F1 = 73.5% kwa kutambua vifaa na F1 = 46.4% kwa ajili ya kutambua mahusiano. Moja ya manufaa ya kutibu huduma za AM kama vile kutegemea kwa biaffin ni ujenzi rahisi unaosababisha. The idea of treating AM as dependency parsing is not new, but has previously been abandoned as it was lagging far behind the state-of-the-art.  Katika uchambuzi wa kina, tunachunguza sababu zinazochangia mafanikio ya mifano yetu: modeli ya upasuaji yenyewe, uwakilishi wetu kwa muundo wa kutegemea hoja, taarifa tofauti katika mtindo wa kisasa, na taarifa za ushirikiano kwa ujumla unaoendelea kwa mtindo huo. Kazi zetu zinaonyesha kuwa kutegemea kuiba wizi wa AM, wazo lililopitiwa kutokea nyuma, linastahili kuangalia zaidi katika siku za usoni.', 'fa': 'نزدیک\u200cهای غیر عصبی برای ذخیره\u200cسازی (AM) اغلب لوله\u200cسازی می\u200cشوند و نیاز به مهندسی ویژه\u200cهای سنگین است. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش عصبی به پایان رسیدن به AM که بر پایان پایان بستگی است، در مقابل وضعیت هنر فعلی که بر استخراج ارتباط بستگی دارد. ویرایشگر بستگی\u200cهای biaffine AM به طور کلی بیشتر از وضعیت هنر انجام می\u200cدهد که در F1 = 73.5 درصد برای شناسایی عنصر و F1 = 46.4 درصد برای شناسایی ارتباط انجام می\u200cدهد. یکی از منافع درمان AM به عنوان تجزیه بستگی بینافین ساده معماری عصبی است که نتیجه می دهد. ایده درمان به عنوان تجزیه بستگی AM جدید نیست، ولی قبلاً از آن ترک شده است، همانطور که در پشت وضعیت هنر دور گذاشته است. در یک تحلیل کامل، ما باعث تحقیق faktورهایی هستیم که به موفقیت مدل ما کمک می کنند: خودش مدل بی\u200cفاین، نمایش ما برای ساختار بستگی از ارائه\u200cها، کودهای متفاوتی در مدل بی\u200cفاین، و اطلاعات سینتیکی اضافه به مدل غذا داده شده است. کارمون نشون ميده که وابستگي وابستگي براي امروز، ايده اي از گذشته، لياقت توجه بيشتري در آينده داره.', 'tr': "Näyral köçürmek üçin (AM) argümentleri köplenç pipe çykarylýar we agyr özellikler-enjiniýetlere gerek. Bu kagyzda, biz AB'e bağlılık parslamasına dayanan näyral a şagy taýýarlanan bir approach teklif edip görýäris. Biziň biafin AM baglanylyk tanatçysymyz möhüm bir sanat durumyny üstün edýär, F1 = 73.5% komponent kimligi üçin performansy we F1 = 46.4% ilişkiler kimligi üçin çykýar. AM'yi biafin bağlılığı ayırmak olarak tedavi etmenin bir avantajı, neticede basit bir nöral arhitektir. Aýa-lyk taýýarlyk ayırmagy ýaly tertiblemek pikir täze däldir, ýöne öňünden hem bu sanat durumynyň arkasynda durmuşy üçin terk edildi. Tüm bir analizimde, modelimizin başarısızlığına katkı eden faktörleri soruşuyoruz: biafin modeli kendisi, argumentlerin bağlılılık yapısının temsilimizi, biafin model in in farklı kodlayıcılarıyla ve sintaktik bilgileri de model'e eklendirildi. Biziň işimiz MŞ üçin bağlyklyk analyziýasyny, geçmişden öňünden göz öňünden geçen pikir, gelejekde köp üns çekmelidigini görkez.", 'bg': 'Неневралните подходи за аргументиране (АМ) често са тръбопроводи и изискват тежко инженерство на функциите. В настоящата статия предлагаме невронен подход от край до край към АМ, който се основава на анализ на зависимостта, за разлика от сегашното състояние на изкуството, което разчита на извличане на релации. Нашият биафинов анализатор на зависимост значително превъзхожда най-съвременните, като се представя при F1 = 73,5% за идентификация на компонентите и F1 = 46,4% за идентификация на отношенията. Едно от предимствата на третирането на АМ като анализ на зависимостта от биафин е простата невронна архитектура, която води до това. Идеята за третиране на АМ като анализ на зависимостта не е нова, но преди това е била изоставена, тъй като изоставаше далеч от съвременните технологии. В задълбочен анализ изследваме факторите, които допринасят за успеха на нашия модел: самият биафинов модел, нашето представяне за структурата на зависимостта на аргументите, различни кодери в биафиновия модел и синтактична информация допълнително подавана към модела. Работата ни показва, че анализирането на зависимостта за АМ, пренебрегната идея от миналото, заслужава повече внимание в бъдеще.', 'af': "Nie- neurale toegang tot argument mining (AM) is dikwels pipelineëerd en benodig swaar funksie-inženiering. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n neurale end-to-end-approach na AM wat gebaseer is op afhanklikheid verwerking, in contrast tot die huidige state-of-the-art wat op verhouding van uittrekking aflyk. Ons biaffine AM afhanklikheidspanser betekeurig uitvoer die state-of-the-art, uitvoer by F1 = 73.5% vir komponent identifikasie en F1 = 46.4% vir verwanting identifikasie. Een van die voordeel van die behandeling van AM as biaffin afhanklikheid verwerking is die eenvoudige neurale arkitektuur wat resultaat. Die idee van behandeling van AM as afhanklikheid verwerking is nie nuwe nie, maar is voorheen verlaat omdat dit verlaat het ver agter die staat van die kuns. In 'n groot analisie, ondersoek ons die faktore wat bydra tot die sukses van ons model: die biaffine model selfs, ons voorstelling vir die afhanklikheid struktuur van argumente, verskillende koders in die biaffine model en sintaktiese inligting bymekaar aan die model gevoer word. Ons werk bevestig dat afhanklikheid verwerking vir AM, 'n oorskynlike idee van die verlede verwerf meer aandag in die toekoms.", 'am': 'የአውራጆች ግንኙነት መቆጣጠር (AM) ብዙ ጊዜ እየተከፋፈሉ እና የከበደ የፊደል-engineering ያስፈልጋሉ። በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ በተደገመ ፓርቲ ላይ የተቀመጠውን የአሜን የዘላለም መጨረሻ ልውጤት እናሳልጋለን፡፡ የብፊን አሜሪካ ታዋቂነት ተፈላጊነታችን የ-የ-አርእስት ሀገሪቱን በተለየ ያሳያል፤ F1 = 73.5 በመቶ አካባቢው ማረጋገጫ እና F1 = 46.4 በመቶ ለግንኙነት ማውቀት ነው፡፡ የአሜሪካ ጥቅምቶች አንዱ የቢፊን ደጋፊ ማጋራት ፍለጋት ፍላጎት ነው፡፡ የአሜሪካ አካባቢ የፓርላማ ማቀናቀል አዲስ አይደለም፣ ነገር ግን ከዚህ በፊት ከሀገር-አርእስት ጀምሮ ተለይቷል፡፡ በሙሉ አስተያየት፣ የሞዴል ማድረግ የሚጠቅመውን ውጤቶች እናመርመራለን፤ የቢፊን ሞዴል ራሳችን፣ የአዋራጆች ግንኙነት አካባቢ፣ የብፊን ዓይነቶች የተለየ የፊፊኒን አካውንዶች እና በተጨማሪም መረጃዎችን ለሞዴል እና እና በተጨማሪነት ማህበራችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ሥራችን ለቀድሞው የአሜን መዘጋጀት የሚታመነ አእምሮን፣ የቀድሞው ጉዳይ፣ ለፍጻሜው የበለጠ ማስታወቂያ ይገባዋል፡፡', 'sq': 'Non-neural approaches to argument mining (AM) are often pipelined and require heavy feature-engineering.  Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një qasje nervore nga fundi në fund për AM që bazohet në analizimin e varësisë, në kundërshtim me gjendjen aktuale të artit që mbështetet në nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve. Analizatori ynë i varësisë së biffinit AM ekziston në mënyrë të konsiderueshme më i lartë se më i miri, duke vepruar në F1 = 73.5% për identifikimin e komponenteve dhe F1 = 46.4% për identifikimin e marrëdhënieve. Një nga avantazhet e trajtimit të AM si analizimi i varësisë së biffinit është arkitektura e thjeshtë neurone që rezultaton. Ideja e trajtimit të AM si analizimi i varësisë nuk është e re, por më parë është braktisur pasi ajo ishte shumë prapa shtetit të teknologjisë. Në një analizë të thellë, ne hetojmë faktorët që kontribuojnë në suksesin e modelit tonë: modeli biafin vetë, përfaqësimi ynë për strukturën e varësisë së argumenteve, koduesit e ndryshëm në model in biafin dhe informacioni sintaktik shtesë i ushqyer modelit. Puna jonë demonstron se analiza e varësisë për AM, një ide e harruar nga e kaluara, meriton më shumë vëmendje në të ardhmen.', 'ko': '파라미터 발굴(AM)의 비신경 방법은 통상적으로 유수선으로 대량의 특징 공정이 필요하다.본고에서 우리는 의존 해석을 바탕으로 하는 신경 끝에서 끝까지의 AM 방법을 제시하여 현재의 의존 관계에서 추출한 최신 기술에 비해우리biaffine AM 의존항 해석기의 성능은 가장 선진적인 기술보다 현저히 우수하다. 구성 요소 식별의 성능은 F1=73.5%이고 관계 식별의 성능은 F1=46.4%이다.AM을 쌍방향 모방 의존 해석으로 보는 장점 중 하나는 그 결과가 간단한 신경 구조라는 것이다.AM을 의존항 해석으로 보는 생각은 신선하지 않았지만, 가장 선진적인 기술에 훨씬 뒤떨어졌기 때문에 이전에는 포기되었다.깊이 있는 분석에서 우리는 우리의 모델 성공을 촉진하는 요소인 비야핀 모델 자체, 우리가 파라미터에 대한 의존 구조의 표시, 비야핀 모델 중의 서로 다른 인코더, 그리고 모델에 추가로 제공하는 문법 정보를 조사했다.우리의 업무는 AM의 의존 해석이 과거에 소홀히 여겨졌던 생각이므로 미래에 더욱 관심을 가져야 한다는 것을 보여준다.', 'hy': 'Հաճախ խողովակներ են կատարվում և անհրաժեշտ են ծանր հատկանիշների ճարտարագիտություն: In this paper, we propose a neural end-to-end approach to AM which is based on dependency parsing, in contrast to the current state-of-the-art which relies on relation extraction.  Մեր բիաֆինի ԱՄ-ի կախվածության վերլուծումը նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում է ամենաբարձր արդյունքը, որը արտադրում է F1 = 73.5 տոկոսով բաղադրիչների հայտնաբերման համար, իսկ F1 = 46.4 տոկոսով հարաբերության հայտնաբերման համար: ԱՄ-ի վերաբերյալ որպես բիաֆինի կախվածության վերլուծության առավելություններից մեկն այն պարզ նյարդային ճարտարապետությունն է, որը արդյունքում է: ԱՄ-ի վերաբերյալ որպես կախվածության վերլուծում վերաբերյալ գաղափարը նոր չէ, բայց նախկինում հեռացվել է, քանի որ այն շատ հետաքրքիր ժամանակաշրջանում էր: Մենք հիմնական վերլուծության մեջ ուսումնասիրում ենք այն գործոնները, որոնք ներդրում են մեր մոդելի հաջողության մեջ. երկաֆինի մոդելը ինքն է, մեր ներկայացումը բանավեճերի կախվածության կառուցվածքի համար, երկաֆինի մոդելի տարբեր կոդավորումները և նաև մոդելի սինտակտիկ տեղեկատվությունը: Մեր աշխատանքը ցույց է տալիս, որ ԱՄ-ի կախվածության վերլուծությունը, անցյալի անտեսված գաղափար, ապագայում ավելի շատ ուշադրություն է արժանի:', 'bs': 'Ne-neuralni pristupi rudarstvu argumentacija (AM) često su otvoreni i zahtijevaju teški inženjering feature-engineering. U ovom papiru predlažemo neuralni pristup AM-u koji se temelji na analizu zavisnosti, u suprotnosti sa trenutnom stanju umjetnosti koja se oslanja na ekstrakciju odnosa. Naš analitičar ovisnosti biafina AM značajno iznosi stanje umjetnosti, koji izvodi na F1 = 73,5% za identifikaciju komponenta i F1 = 46,4% za identifikaciju odnosa. Jedna od prednosti liječenja AM kao analiza ovisnosti biafina je jednostavna neuralna arhitektura koja rezultira. Ideja liječenja AM kao analiza ovisnosti nije nova, ali je ranije napuštena jer je ostavila daleko iza države umjetnosti. U temeljnoj analizi istražujemo faktore koji doprinose uspjehu našeg model a: samog modela biafina, naše zastupanje za strukturu ovisnosti argumentacija, različite kodere u modelu biafina i sintaktične informacije dodatno hranjene modelu. Naš rad pokazuje da razmatranje zavisnosti za AM, pretjerano ideja iz prošlosti zaslužuje više pažnje u budućnosti.', 'ca': "Els enfocaments no neuronals a la mineria d'arguments (AM) sovint es produeixen i requereixen enginyeria pesada. En aquest paper, proposem un enfocament neuronal final a final de la AM basat en l'analització de la dependencia, en contrast amb l'actual estat d'avançat que es basa en l'extracció de relacions. Our biaffine AM dependency parser significantly outperforms the state-of-the-art, performing at F1 = 73.5% for component identification and F1 = 46.4% for relation identification.  Una de les avantatges del tractament de l'AM com a analització de la dependencia biffina és la simple arquitectura neuronal que resulta. La idea de tractar l'AM com a l'analització de la dependencia no és nova, però s'ha abandonat abans perquè es quedava molt darrere de l'última. En una anàlisi detallada, investigam els factors que contribueixen a l'èxit del nostre model: el model biaffin mateix, la nostra representació per l'estructura de dependencia dels arguments, diferents codificadors del model biaffin, i la informació sinàctica alimentada addicionalment al model. La nostra feina demostra que l'analisi de la dependencia per a AM, una idea ignorada del passat, mereix més atenció en el futur.", 'bn': 'Non-neural approaches to argument mining (AM) are often pipelined and require heavy feature-engineering.  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা এম-এর কাছে একটি নিউরেল শেষ প্রস্তাব করি যা নির্ভরিত পার্জিং এর উপরে ভিত্তিক, বর্তমান রাষ্ট্রের-শিল্পের পরিবর্তে যা সম্পর্কের ব আমাদের বিফিন এম নির্ভরশীল বিশেষ পরিসংখ্যানের ব্যাপার গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভাবে প্রকাশ করেছে, যা এফ১-এ প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে ৭৩. বিফিন নির্ভরশীল পার্সিং হিসেবে এমনকে চিকিৎসা করার একটি সুবিধা এম-কে নির্ভরশীল পার্সিং হিসেবে চিকিৎসা করার চিন্তা নতুন নয়, কিন্তু পূর্বেই তাকে ছেড়ে দেয়া হয়েছে যেহেতু এটা রাষ্ট্রের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বিশ্লেষণে আমরা আমাদের মডেলের সফলতার কারণে যে কারণগুলোকে অবদান করেছি তা তদন্ত করেছি: বিফিন মডেল নিজেই, যুক্তির নির্ভর কাঠামোর জন্য আমাদের প্রতিনিধিত্ব আমাদের কাজ দেখাচ্ছে যে এমএসের জন্য নির্ভর পার্সিং করা, অতীত থেকে ভুলে গেছে, ভবিষ্যতে আরো মনোযোগ প্রদান করা উচিত।', 'et': 'Mitte-neuraalsed lähenemisviisid argumentide kaevandamisele (AM) on sageli torujuhtmed ja nõuavad rasket funktsioonide insenerimist. Käesolevas töös pakume välja neuraalse lõpp-otsa lähenemisviisi AM-ile, mis põhineb sõltuvuse parsimisel, vastupidiselt praegusele tehnika tasemele, mis tugineb seoste ekstraheerimisele. Meie biafiini AM sõltuvuse parser ületab oluliselt kaasaegset taset, saavutades F1 = 73,5% komponentide identifitseerimisel ja F1 = 46,4% seoste identifitseerimisel. Üks eeliseid AM-i käsitlemisel biafiinisõltuvuse parsimisena on lihtne neuroarhitektuur, mis tekib. Idee käsitleda AM kui sõltuvuse parsimist ei ole uus, kuid varem on loobutud, kuna see oli palju maha jäänud tehnika tasemest. Põhjalikus analüüsis uurime tegureid, mis aitavad kaasa meie mudeli edule: biafiinmudel ise, argumentide sõltuvusstruktuuri esitamine, biafiinmudeli erinevad kodeerijad ja mudelile lisatud süntaktiline informatsioon. Meie töö näitab, et minevikust mööda jäetud idee AM sõltuvuse parsimine väärib tulevikus rohkem tähelepanu.', 'cs': 'Neneuronové přístupy k dolování argumentů (AM) jsou často potrubí a vyžadují těžké funkční inženýrství. V tomto článku navrhujeme neuronový end-to-end přístup k AM, který je založen na analýze závislostí, na rozdíl od současného stavu techniky, který se opírá o extrakci vztahů. Náš biafinový AM závislostní parser výrazně překonává nejmodernější stav techniky, působí při identifikaci součástí F1,73,5% a F1,46,4% pro identifikaci vztahů. Jednou z výhod považování AM za analýzu závislosti biafinu je jednoduchá neuronová architektura, která výsledkem je. Myšlenka zacházení s AM jako s analýzou závislostí není nová, ale dříve byla opuštěna, protože zaostávala daleko za nejmodernějším stavem. V důkladné analýze zkoumáme faktory, které přispívají k úspěchu našeho modelu: samotný biafinový model, naše reprezentace závislostní struktury argumentů, různé kodéry v biafinovém modelu a syntaktické informace dodatečně přiváděné do modelu. Naše práce ukazuje, že analýza závislosti pro AM, přehlížená myšlenka z minulosti, si v budoucnu zaslouží větší pozornost.', 'fi': 'Ei-neuraalisia lähestymistapoja argumenttien louhintaan (AM) käytetään usein putkistoja ja vaativat raskasta ominaisuussuunnittelua. Tässä työssä ehdotamme neuroaalista end-to-end-lähestymistapaa AM:ään, joka perustuu riippuvuuden parsaukseen, toisin kuin nykyinen nykytekniikka, joka perustuu relaatiouuttoon. Biafiininen AM-riippuvuuden jäsentäjämme suoriutuu merkittävästi nykytekniikan tasosta, sillä se on F1 = 73,5% komponentin tunnistamisessa ja F1 = 46,4% suhteessa tunnistamisessa. Yksi eduista käsitellä AM:ää biafiiniriippuvuuden parsauksena on yksinkertainen neuroarkkitehtuuri, joka johtaa. Ajatus AM:n kohdentamisesta riippuvuuden jäsentämisenä ei ole uusi, mutta se on aiemmin hylätty, koska se oli paljon jäljessä nykytekniikasta. Perusteellisessa analyysissä selvitämme mallin onnistumiseen vaikuttavia tekijöitä: itse biafiinimalli, argumenttien riippuvuusrakenteen representaatio, erilaiset biafiinimallin kooderit sekä malliin syötetty syntaktinen tieto. Työssämme osoitetaan, että riippuvuuden parsaus AM: lle, joka on unohdettu menneisyydestä, ansaitsee enemmän huomiota tulevaisuudessa.', 'az': "Argument mining (AM) üçün nöral olmayan yaxınlıqlar çox dəyişdirilmişdir və ağır özellik inženjeri lazımdır. Bu kağızda, AM-ə bağlılıq ayırmasına dayanan bir nöral sona-sona yaxınlığını təklif edirik. Şimdiki məktəbənin əlaqəsində bağlılıq əlaqəsinə dayanır. Bizim biaffin AM bağımlılığımız ayırıcımız, F1 = 73,5% komponent kimliğinin və F1 = 46,4% ilişkilərin kimliğinin vəzifəsində istifadə edir. AM'i biafin bağlılığı ayırması kimi təhsil etmək üçün mənfəətlərindən biri nəticə edir. AM təvəkküllük ayırması kimi tedavi etmək fikri yeni deyil, amma əvvəllər tərk edilmişdir, çünki o, sanatın vəziyyətinin arxasında uzaq qalmışdır. Biz modelimizin başarısızlığına kömək edən faktorlarını təhsil edirik: biafin modeli özü, argumentlərin bağımlılığı quruluşu, biafin model in in fərqli kodlayıcıları və sintaktik məlumatların modelini daha çox təhsil edir. Bizim işlərimiz AM üçün bağımlılıq ayırılması, keçmişdən aşağılanmış fikir, gələcəkdə daha çox ünsiyyət sahibi olduğunu göstərir.", 'ha': 'QXml Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata hanyoyi ta ƙara zuwa AM, wanda yake a kan sali da parse, da inganci da halin-sanar da ke dõgara ga masu tsari. Babu biffine AM deposition Parser significantly outperforms the state-of-the-art, performing at F1=73.5% for id-compound and F1=46.4% for id-link. Bayan kyauta daga kure AM kamar biffine dependanci parse is the sauƙin architecture of neural that will end. The idea of treating AM as dependency parsing is not new, but has previously been abandoned as it was lagging far behind the state-of-the-art.  Daga ƙidãya, Munã ƙidãya masu fassarar misãlani da ke ƙara wa mafanicin misalinmu: misalin bisafin ne, masu bincike wa matsayin baka-baka, ko da kwamfyuta daban a cikin misalin bisafin, da kuma masu haɗi lãbãri na ƙaranci zuwa misali. Kayinmu na nuna cewa, ana dõgara parge ga AM, wani idãnun da aka manta daga zaman, yana kamata ta zama masu kalma a gaba.', 'he': 'גישות לא עצביות למכריית טיעונים (AM) לעתים קרובות מוצננות ומדרושות מהנדסה תכונות כבדות. In this paper, we propose a neural end-to-end approach to AM which is based on dependency parsing, in contrast to the current state-of-the-art which relies on relation extraction.  מפרסם ההתמודדות ביאפין אמ שלנו יוצא משמעותית מהמצב המיוחד, ביצוע ב-F1 = 73.5% לזהות רכיבים ו-F1 = 46.4% לזהות יחסים. אחד היתרונות של התייחסות לאי.אם.איי כמחקר תלויות ביאפין הוא הארכיטקטורה העצבית הפשוטה שמוציאת. הרעיון להתייחס לאמ.איי. כמחקר תלויות הוא לא חדש, אלא ננטש קודם לכן כי הוא התעכב רחוק מאחורי המצב האמנתי. בניתוח יסודי, אנו חוקרים את הגורמים שמתרומים להצלחה של המודל שלנו: מודל הביאפין עצמו, מייצג שלנו למבנה התלוי של ויכוחים, קודנים שונים במודל הביאפין, ומידע סינטקטי שנאכיל באופן נוסף למודל. העבודה שלנו מראה כי בדיקת תלויות עבור AM, רעיון שנעלם מהעבר, מגיע תשומת לב יותר בעתיד.', 'sk': 'Nenevralni pristopi k rudarjenju argumentov (AM) so pogosto usmerjeni in zahtevajo težko inženiring funkcij. V tem prispevku predlagamo nevronski pristop od konca do konca k AM, ki temelji na razčlenitvi odvisnosti, v nasprotju s sedanjim stanjem tehnike, ki temelji na ekstrakciji relacij. Naš biafinski računalnik odvisnosti AM bistveno presega najsodobnejši računalnik, saj deluje pri F1 = 73,5% za identifikacijo komponent in F1 = 46,4% za identifikacijo relacij. Ena od prednosti obravnavanja AM kot analiziranja biafinske odvisnosti je preprosta nevronska arhitektura, ki nastane. Zamisel o obravnavi AM kot razčlenitvi odvisnosti ni nova, vendar je bila prej opuščena, saj je daleč zaostajala za najsodobnejšimi. V temeljiti analizi raziskujemo dejavnike, ki prispevajo k uspehu našega modela: sam biafinski model, naš predstavitev strukture odvisnosti argumentov, različne kodirje v biafinskem modelu in sintaktične informacije, ki so dodatno dodane modelu. Naše delo dokazuje, da si razčlenitev odvisnosti za AM, spregledana ideja iz preteklosti, v prihodnosti zasluži več pozornosti.', 'jv': 'text-box-mode Nang kuwi iki, nggunakake tresnaning akake nggawe sistem Neral end-to-end nggo AM sing basa gambar nggawe urip urip, contrast to the current state-of-the-Art that rests on the extract nggawe Kita biaFine AM dipunangke dipunangke punter tentang nggawe state-of-the-arts, iso nggawe F1 = 75.5% kanggo Ketoken nggo Ketoken Karo F1 = 49.4% kanggo Ketoken nggo Ketoken Omah sing dibutuhke sing dibutuhke AM nganggo cahuruhke dipunangkapan ning biaFin, kuwi sampeyan architecture sing dadi nyimpen Panjenengan nggawe AM nganggep dipunangé karo urip-urip kuwi nggawe ngubah, nguasai katimbang ono wektu nggawe ngupakan durung-kebutuhan. Nang dhéwé éntuk karo perusahaan sing dibutuhke, kéné iso nggunakake karo perusahaan ingkang nggawe modèl dhéwé: ndéwé biaFin, ndéwé iso nggawe sistem dipatensi diangké, koder diangké ing model biaFin, lan informasi sistem sing dadi supaya supaya sak modèl Awakdhéwé nggawe barang nggawe dipunangé tarjamahan kanggo AM, akeh sing paling nggawe gerakan, kuwi mau njaluk sing luwih apik kanggo ngerti.', 'bo': 'Non-neural approaches to argument mining (AM) are often pipelined and require heavy feature-engineering. འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ། ང་ཚོས་AM་དང་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དེ་ནི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བ་མིན་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོའི་biaffine AM dependency parser significantly outperforms the state-of-the-art, performing at F1 = 73.5% for component identification and F1 = 46.4% for relation identification. AM གཟུགས་རིས་རྟེན་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡིན་པའི་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཚོགས་ལས་ཀྱང་གཅིག་ནི་རྐྱེན་སྒྲིག་གཞུང་གི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག AM རྟེན་འབྲེལ་གྱི་མིག In a thorough analysis, we investigate the factors that contribute to the success of our model: the biaffine model itself, our representation for the dependency structure of arguments, different encoders in the biaffine model, and syntactic information additionally fed to the model. ང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་ལྟ་བུའི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བ་ཞིག་འཇུག་སྟངས་པར་ཨ་མ་དེ། འདས་ཟིན་པའི་བསམ'}
{'en': 'CTC-based Compression for Direct Speech Translation', 'es': 'Compresión basada en CTC para traducción directa de voz', 'fr': 'Compression basée sur CTC pour la traduction vocale directe', 'ar': 'ضغط قائم على CTC لترجمة الكلام المباشر', 'pt': 'Compressão baseada em CTC para tradução direta de fala', 'ja': '直接音声翻訳のためのCTCベースの圧縮', 'zh': '基于 CTC 之压缩,用于径音译', 'hi': 'प्रत्यक्ष वाक् अनुवाद के लिए CTC-आधारित संपीड़न', 'ru': 'Сжатие на основе CTC для прямого перевода речи', 'ga': 'Comhbhrú CTC-bhunaithe le haghaidh Aistriúchán Urlabhra Díreach', 'hu': 'CTC-alapú tömörítés a közvetlen beszédfordításhoz', 'ka': 'Comment', 'kk': 'CTC- негіздеген тікелей сөз аудармасының компрессиясы', 'it': 'Compressione basata su CTC per la traduzione vocale diretta', 'mk': 'Name', 'lt': 'tiesioginio kalbos vertimo kompresija, pagrįsta CTC', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Kompressjoni bbażata fuq CTC għat-Traduzzjoni Diretta tal-Kellem', 'el': 'Συμπίεση με βάση CTC για άμεση μετάφραση ομιλίας', 'ml': 'Direct Speech Translation', 'pl': 'Kompresja oparta na CTC do bezpośredniego tłumaczenia mowy', 'ro': 'Comprimare bazată pe CTC pentru traducerea vorbirii directe', 'sr': 'Kompresija na CTC-u za prevod direktnog govora', 'no': 'Comment', 'sv': 'CTC-baserad komprimering för direkttalöversättning', 'si': 'Comment', 'ta': 'நேரடி பேச்சு மொழிபெயர்ப்புக்கான CTC- அடிப்படையிலான Compression', 'ur': 'Comment', 'so': 'CTC-based Compression for Direct Speech Translation', 'mn': 'CTC-ын үндсэн зөв хэлний орчуулалт', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tập tin về văn bản Comment', 'bg': 'CTC- базирано компресиране за директен превод на реч', 'da': 'CTC-baseret komprimering til direkte tale oversættelse', 'hr': 'Kompresija na CTC-u za prevod direktnog govora', 'nl': 'CTC-gebaseerde compressie voor directe spraakvertaling', 'id': 'CTC-based Compression for Direct Speech Translation', 'ko': 'CTC 기반 직접 음성 번역 압축', 'de': 'CTC-basierte Komprimierung für die direkte Sprachübersetzung', 'fa': 'Comment', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya moja kwa moja kwa moja', 'af': 'Comment', 'tr': 'CTC tabanly Sözler Çevirmek üçin Sykmak', 'sq': 'Kompresioni i bazuar në CTC për përkthimin direkt të fjalës', 'am': 'ትርጉም', 'hy': 'Առաջին խոսքի թարգմանման', 'bn': 'Direct Speak অনুবাদের জন্য CTC ভিত্তিক কপ্রেশন', 'bs': 'Kompresija na CTC-u za prevod direktnog govora', 'az': 'Doğrudan Söz Çeviri üçün CTC tabanlı Kompresyon', 'fi': 'CTC- pohjainen pakkaus suorapuhekäännöstä varten', 'et': 'CTC-põhine tihendamine otsekõne tõlkimiseks', 'cs': 'Komprese založená na CTC pro přímý překlad řeči', 'ca': 'CTC-based Compression for Direct Speech Translation', 'he': 'לחיצה מבוססת על CTC לתרגום דיבור ישיר', 'sk': 'Kompresija na osnovi CTC za neposredno prevajanje govora', 'bo': 'CTC-based Compression for Direct Speech Translation', 'jv': 'Compresion', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name'}
{'en': 'Previous studies demonstrated that a dynamic phone-informed compression of the input audio is beneficial for speech translation (ST). However, they required a dedicated model for phone recognition and did not test this solution for direct ST, in which a single model translates the input audio into the target language without intermediate representations. In this work, we propose the first method able to perform a dynamic compression of the input in direct ST models. In particular, we exploit the Connectionist Temporal Classification (CTC) to compress the input sequence according to its phonetic characteristics. Our experiments demonstrate that our solution brings a 1.3-1.5 BLEU improvement over a strong baseline on two language pairs (English-Italian and English-German), contextually reducing the memory footprint by more than 10 %.', 'ar': 'أظهرت الدراسات السابقة أن الضغط الديناميكي عبر الهاتف لإدخال الصوت مفيد لترجمة الكلام (ST). ومع ذلك ، فقد طلبوا نموذجًا مخصصًا للتعرف على الهاتف ولم يختبروا هذا الحل لـ ST المباشر ، حيث يقوم نموذج واحد بترجمة صوت الإدخال إلى اللغة الهدف دون تمثيلات وسيطة. في هذا العمل ، نقترح الطريقة الأولى القادرة على إجراء ضغط ديناميكي للمدخلات في نماذج ST المباشرة. على وجه الخصوص ، نستغل التصنيف الزماني الوصلي (CTC) لضغط تسلسل الإدخال وفقًا لخصائصه الصوتية. توضح تجاربنا أن الحل الذي نقدمه يحقق تحسنًا بنسبة 1.3-1.5 في BLEU مقارنة بخط أساس قوي في أزواج لغتين (الإنجليزية-الإيطالية والإنجليزية-الألمانية) ، مما يقلل من أثر الذاكرة في السياق بأكثر من 10٪.', 'fr': "Des études antérieures ont démontré qu'une compression dynamique de l'audio d'entrée, adaptée au téléphone, est bénéfique pour la traduction vocale (ST). Cependant, ils avaient besoin d'un modèle dédié pour la reconnaissance téléphonique et n'ont pas testé cette solution pour la ST directe, dans laquelle un seul modèle traduit l'audio d'entrée dans la langue cible sans représentations intermédiaires. Dans ce travail, nous proposons la première méthode capable d'effectuer une compression dynamique de l'entrée dans des modèles ST directs. En particulier, nous exploitons la classification temporelle connectionniste (CTC) pour compresser la séquence d'entrée en fonction de ses caractéristiques phonétiques. Nos expériences démontrent que notre solution apporte une amélioration de 1,3 à 1,5 BLEU par rapport à une base solide sur deux paires de langues (anglais-italien et anglais-allemand), réduisant ainsi l'empreinte mémoire de plus de 10\xa0%.", 'pt': 'Estudos anteriores demonstraram que uma compressão dinâmica informada por telefone do áudio de entrada é benéfica para a tradução de fala (ST). No entanto, eles exigiram um modelo dedicado para reconhecimento de telefone e não testaram essa solução para ST direto, em que um único modelo traduz o áudio de entrada para o idioma de destino sem representações intermediárias. Neste trabalho, propomos o primeiro método capaz de realizar uma compressão dinâmica da entrada em modelos ST diretos. Em particular, exploramos a Classificação Temporal Conexionista (CTC) para comprimir a sequência de entrada de acordo com suas características fonéticas. Nossos experimentos demonstram que nossa solução traz uma melhoria de 1,3-1,5 BLEU sobre uma linha de base forte em dois pares de idiomas (inglês-italiano e inglês-alemão), reduzindo contextualmente o consumo de memória em mais de 10%.', 'es': 'Estudios anteriores demostraron que una compresión dinámica basada en el teléfono del audio de entrada es beneficiosa para la traducción de voz (ST). Sin embargo, necesitaron un modelo específico para el reconocimiento de teléfonos y no probaron esta solución para ST directa, en la que un solo modelo traduce el audio de entrada al idioma de destino sin representaciones intermedias. En este trabajo, proponemos el primer método capaz de realizar una compresión dinámica de la entrada en modelos ST directos. En particular, aprovechamos la Clasificación Temporal Conneccionista (CTC) para comprimir la secuencia de entrada de acuerdo con sus características fonéticas. Nuestros experimentos demuestran que nuestra solución aporta una mejora de 1.3-1.5 BLEU sobre una base sólida en dos pares de idiomas (inglés-italiano e inglés-alemán), lo que reduce contextualmente la huella de memoria en más de un 10%.', 'zh': '前论明,输音频之动电话通压缩利于音译(ST)。 然须专用手机识模形,并不以径ST试解决方案,其单将输入音频转为的言语,而无中表。 凡此诸事,第一能于直ST模形中对输压缩法。 特以接主义时类(CTC)随其语音压缩输入序。 臣等实验明,比于(英语-意大利语、英语-德语)之强基线,吾解决方案致 1.3-1.5 BLEU,于上下文减内存占用量 10% 以上。', 'ja': '以前の研究は、入力オーディオの動的な電話情報による圧縮が音声翻訳（ ST ）に有益であることを実証した。しかしながら、電話認識のための専用モデルが必要であり、単一のモデルが中間表現なしに入力オーディオをターゲット言語に変換する直接STについてこのソリューションをテストしませんでした。本研究では、直接STモデルで入力の動的圧縮を行うことができる最初の方法を提案する。特に、コネクショニスト時間分類（ ＣＴＣ ）を利用して、その音声特性に従って入力シーケンスを圧縮する。私たちの実験は、私たちのソリューションが2つの言語ペア（英語-イタリア語と英語-ドイツ語）の強力なベースラインに対して1.3-1.5 BLEUの改善をもたらし、記憶フットプリントを10%以上減らすことを示しています。', 'ru': 'Предыдущие исследования показали, что динамическое телефонно-информированное сжатие входного звука полезно для перевода речи (ST). Однако им требовалась специальная модель для распознавания телефонов и они не тестировали это решение для прямого ST, в котором одна модель переводит входной звук на целевой язык без промежуточных представлений. В этой работе мы предлагаем первый метод, способный выполнять динамическое сжатие входных данных в прямых моделях ST. В частности, мы используем Connectionist Temporal Classification (CTC) для сжатия входной последовательности в соответствии с ее фонетическими характеристиками. Наши эксперименты показывают, что наше решение приносит улучшение 1,3-1,5 BLEU по сравнению с сильной базовой линией на двух языковых парах (английско-итальянский и английско-немецкий), контекстуально уменьшая отпечаток памяти более чем на 10%.', 'hi': 'पिछले अध्ययनों से पता चला है कि इनपुट ऑडियो का एक गतिशील फोन-सूचित संपीड़न भाषण अनुवाद (एसटी) के लिए फायदेमंद है। हालांकि, उन्हें फोन मान्यता के लिए एक समर्पित मॉडल की आवश्यकता थी और प्रत्यक्ष एसटी के लिए इस समाधान का परीक्षण नहीं किया गया था, जिसमें एक एकल मॉडल इनपुट ऑडियो को मध्यवर्ती प्रतिनिधित्व के बिना लक्ष्य भाषा में अनुवाद करता है। इस काम में, हम प्रत्यक्ष एसटी मॉडल में इनपुट के गतिशील संपीड़न को निष्पादित करने में सक्षम पहली विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम अपनी ध्वन्यात्मक विशेषताओं के अनुसार इनपुट अनुक्रम को संपीड़ित करने के लिए कनेक्शनिस्ट टेम्पोरल क्लासिफिकेशन (सीटीसी) का शोषण करते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा समाधान दो भाषा जोड़े (अंग्रेजी-इतालवी और अंग्रेजी-जर्मन) पर एक मजबूत आधार रेखा पर 1.3-1.5 BLEU सुधार लाता है, प्रासंगिक रूप से स्मृति पदचिह्न को 10% से अधिक कम करता है।', 'ga': "Léiríodh i staidéir roimhe seo go bhfuil comhbhrú dinimiciúil bunaithe ar an bhfón den fhuaim ionchuir tairbheach don aistriúchán cainte (ST). Mar sin féin, bhí múnla tiomnaithe d'aitheantas fóin ag teastáil uathu agus níor thástáil siad an réiteach seo le haghaidh ST díreach, ina n-aistríonn múnla amháin an fhuaim ionchuir go dtí an sprioctheanga gan uiríll idirmheánacha. Sa obair seo, molaimid an chéad mhodh atá in ann comhbhrú dinimiciúil a dhéanamh ar an ionchur i múnlaí díreacha ST. Go háirithe, bainimid leas as Aicmiú Sealadach an Chónascaire (CTC) chun an t-ord ionchuir a chomhbhrú de réir a saintréithe foghraíochta. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh go dtugann ár réiteach feabhas 1.3-1.5 BLEU thar bhunlíne láidir ar dhá phéire teanga (Béarla-Iodáilis agus Béarla-Gearmáinis), ag laghdú an lorg cuimhne níos mó ná 10% go comhthéacsúil.", 'hu': 'Korábbi tanulmányok kimutatták, hogy a bemeneti hang dinamikus, telefonos tömörítése előnyös a beszédfordításban (ST). Mindazonáltal szükségük volt egy speciális modellre a telefonfelismeréshez, és nem tesztelték ezt a megoldást a közvetlen ST esetében, amelyben egyetlen modell közbenső reprezentációk nélkül fordítja le a bemeneti hangot a célnyelvre. Ebben a munkában javasoljuk az első olyan módszert, amely képes a bemenet dinamikus tömörítésére közvetlen ST modellekben. Különösen a Connectionist Temporal Classification (CTC) használatával tömörítjük a bemeneti sorozatot annak fonetikai jellemzői szerint. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy megoldásunk 1,3-1,5 BLEU javulást eredményez két nyelvpár (angol-olasz és angol-német) esetében, kontextuálisan több mint 10%-kal csökkentve a memória lábnyomát.', 'kk': 'Алдыңғы зерттеулері, келтірілген аудармалардың (ST) динамикалық телефон мәліметті компрессиясын көрсету үшін пайдалы болады. Бірақ олар телефон анықтау үшін өзгертілген үлгі керек және бұл шешімі тізімді ST үшін тексермеген. Бір үлгі бір үлгі бір аудиоды мақсатты тіліне орташа келтірілмейді. Бұл жұмыс ішінде бірінші әдістерді динамикалық ST үлгілерінде енгізу динамикалық компрессиясын жасауға болады. Мысалы, біз оның фонетикалық қасиеттеріне сәйкес келтірілген келтірілген кезектерді (CTC) Температуралық классификациясын қолдану үшін қолданамыз. Біздің тәжірибеміз, біздің шешіміміз 1,3-1,5 BLEU-нің екі тілдің негізгі сызығын (ағылшын-итальян және ағылшын-неміс) жетілдіру үшін қолданып тұрады.', 'el': 'Προηγούμενες μελέτες έδειξαν ότι μια δυναμική συμπίεση του ήχου εισόδου μέσω τηλεφώνου είναι ευεργετική για τη μετάφραση ομιλίας (ST). Ωστόσο, απαιτούσαν ένα ειδικό μοντέλο αναγνώρισης τηλεφώνου και δεν δοκίμασαν αυτή τη λύση για το άμεσο ST, στο οποίο ένα μόνο μοντέλο μεταφράζει τον ήχο εισόδου στη γλώσσα-στόχο χωρίς ενδιάμεσες αναπαραστάσεις. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε την πρώτη μέθοδο ικανή να εκτελέσει μια δυναμική συμπίεση της εισόδου σε απευθείας μοντέλα ST. Ειδικότερα, αξιοποιούμε τη συνδεσιονιστική χρονική ταξινόμηση (CTC) για να συμπιέσουμε την ακολουθία εισόδου σύμφωνα με τα φωνητικά χαρακτηριστικά της. Τα πειράματά μας αποδεικνύουν ότι η λύση μας φέρνει μια βελτίωση 1.3-1.5 έναντι μιας ισχυρής βάσης σε δύο γλωσσικά ζεύγη (Αγγλικά-Ιταλικά και Αγγλικά-Γερμανικά), μειώνοντας το αποτύπωμα μνήμης κατά περισσότερο από 10%.', 'ka': 'პირველი სწავლებები გამოჩნდა, რომ დავიტანოთ ავდიოს კომპრექციის დინამიკური ტელეფონი ინფორმაციული კომპრექცია (ST) საუბეჭიროა. მაგრამ, ისინი ტელეფონის განაცნობისთვის მოდელის შესაძლებლობა და არ ტესტირებენ ეს პასუხისთვის, რომელიც ერთი მოდელის შესაძლებლობა მოდელის შესაძლებლობა მინიშვნელოვანი ენაში გადატ ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ პირველი მეტი, რომელიც შეგვიძლია გავაკეთოთ დინამიკური კომპრექციის შესაძლებლობა პირველი ST მოდელში. განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ კონფექციური ტემპორალური კლასიფიკაცია (CTC) გამოვიყენებთ, რომ მისი ფონეტიკური პროგრამეტებისთვის შემდეგ შემოწყენების შემდეგ კო ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენება, რომ ჩვენი გახსნა 1.3-1.5 BLEU-ს გაუკეთესება ორი ენის ზოგების ძალიან ფექცია (ანგლისური და ანგლისური-გერმანური) მეხსიერების ფექტის გაუკეთესება', 'mk': 'Претходните студии покажаа дека динамичната компресија на вводниот аудио информирана од телефон е корисна за преводот на говорот (СТ). Сепак, тие бараа посветен модел за препознавање на телефонот и не го тестираа ова решение за директна СТ, во кое еден модел го преведува внатрешниот аудио во јазикот на целта без меѓувремени претставувања. Во оваа работа, предложуваме прв метод кој може да изврши динамична компресија на влогот во директните СТ модели. Особено, ја искористуваме Температурната класификација на Конекционистите (CTC) за да ја компресираме влезната секвенца според нејзините фонетски карактеристики. Нашите експерименти покажуваат дека нашето решение донесе подобрување од 1,3 до 1,5 БЛЕУ во однос на силна основа на двете јазички парови (англиско-италијански и англиско-германски), контекстно намалувајќи го отпечатокот на меморијата за повеќе од 10 отсто', 'it': "Studi precedenti hanno dimostrato che una compressione dinamica basata sul telefono dell'audio in ingresso è vantaggiosa per la traduzione vocale (ST). Tuttavia, hanno richiesto un modello dedicato per il riconoscimento telefonico e non hanno testato questa soluzione per ST diretto, in cui un singolo modello traduce l'audio in ingresso nella lingua di destinazione senza rappresentazioni intermedie. In questo lavoro, proponiamo il primo metodo in grado di eseguire una compressione dinamica dell'ingresso in modelli ST diretti. In particolare, sfruttiamo la Classificazione Temporale Connectionist (CTC) per comprimere la sequenza di input in base alle sue caratteristiche fonetiche. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano che la nostra soluzione porta un miglioramento di 1,3-1,5 BLEU rispetto a una base di base forte su due coppie di lingue (inglese-italiano e inglese-tedesco), riducendo contestualmente l'impronta di memoria di oltre il 10%.", 'lt': 'Ankstesni tyrimai parodė, kad kalbos vertimui naudingas dinaminis įėjimo garso spaudimas su telefonu. Tačiau jiems buvo reikalingas specialus telefono atpažinimo modelis ir šis sprendimas nebuvo išbandytas tiesioginiam ST tyrimui, kuriame vienas modelis verta įvestą garsą į tikslinę kalbą be tarpinių nuorodų. Šiame darbe siūlome pirmąjį metodą, kuris galėtų dinamiškai suspausti tiesioginių ST modelių įvedimą. Visų pirma mes naudojame Konjunkcionizmo laikiną klasifikaciją (CTC), kad suspaustume įvedimo seką pagal jos fonetines charakteristikas. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų sprendimas padės pagerinti BLEU 1,3–1,5 lyginant su tvirtais dviejų kalbų porų (anglų, italų ir anglų-vokiečių) pagrindais, o atminties pėdsakas sumažinamas daugiau kaip 10 proc.', 'ms': 'kajian terdahulu menunjukkan bahawa pemampatan dinamik yang diberitahu telefon bagi audio input adalah berguna untuk terjemahan ucapan (ST). Namun, mereka memerlukan model dedikasi untuk pengenalan telefon dan tidak menguji penyelesaian ini untuk ST langsung, di mana model tunggal menerjemahkan audio input ke dalam bahasa sasaran tanpa perwakilan sementara. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan kaedah pertama yang mampu melakukan pemampatan dinamik input dalam model ST langsung. Secara khususnya, kami mengeksploitasi Klasifikasi Temporal Sambungan (CTC) untuk memaksa urutan input menurut ciri-ciri fonetiknya. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa penyelesaian kami membawa penambahan BLEU 1.3-1.5 atas dasar dasar yang kuat pada dua pasangan bahasa (Inggeris-Itali dan Inggeris-Jerman), secara konteks mengurangkan jejak memori dengan lebih dari 10%.', 'ml': 'മുമ്പുള്ള പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് ഓഡിയോയുടെ ഡൈനാമിക് ഫോണ്\u200d വിവരമറിയിപ്പിക്കുന്ന എന്നാലും അവര്\u200dക്ക് ഫോണ്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള ഒരു പ്രത്യേക മോഡല്\u200d ആവശ്യമുണ്ടായിരുന്നു. നേരിട്ടുള്ള ST നേരിട്ട് ഈ പരിശോധിക്കുന്നില്ല.  ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നേരിട്ട് ST മോഡലില്\u200d ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടിന്റെ ആദ്യ രീതിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dവഹിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്ന ആദ്യ രീതി പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d കോണിക്കെന്റിനെസ്റ്റ് ടെമ്പുറല്\u200d ക്ലാസിഷന്\u200d (സിസി) ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ ഫോണെറ്റിക് ക്രാ Our experiments demonstrate that our solution brings a 1.3-1.5 BLEU improvement over a strong baseline on two language pairs (English-Italian and English-German), contextually reducing the memory footprint by more than 10%.', 'mt': 'Studji preċedenti wrew li kompressjoni dinamika infurmata bit-telefon tal-awdjo tal-input hija ta’ benefiċċju għat-traduzzjoni tad-diskors (ST). Madankollu, kienu jeħtieġu mudell dedikat għar-rikonoxximent tat-telefon u ma ttestjawx din is-soluzzjoni għal ST dirett, li fih mudell wieħed jittraduċi l-awdjo tal-input fil-lingwa fil-mira mingħajr rappreżentazzjonijiet intermedji. F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nipproponu l-ewwel metodu li jista’ jwettaq kompressjoni dinamika tal-input f’mudelli ST diretti. B’mod partikolari, nisfruttaw il-Klassifikazzjoni Temporali tal-Konnessjonisti (CTC) biex nikkompressaw is-sekwenza ta’ input skont il-karatteristiċi fonetiċi tagħha. L-esperimenti tagħna juru li s-soluzzjoni tagħna ġġib titjib tal-BLEU ta’ 1.3-1.5 fuq linja bażi b’saħħitha fuq żewġ pari lingwistiċi (Ingliż-Taljan u Ingliż-Ġermaniż), u b’mod kuntestwali tnaqqas il-marka tal-memorja b’aktar minn 10 %.', 'mn': 'Өмнөх судалгаанууд нь бичсэн аудио (ST) дээр хөгжүүлэхэд ашигтай гэдгийг харуулсан. Гэхдээ тэд утасны танихын тулд сонголт загвар шаардлагагүй. Энэ шийдэлийг шууд ST-ийн шалгалтын тулд шалгагүй. Энэ загварын нэг загвар нь загварын хэл рүү орлуулдаг. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид анхны арга нь шууд ST загварын оролцоог хөгжүүлэх боломжтой. Ялангуяа, бид холбоотой Температур Классификацийг ашиглаж өгөгдлийн дарааллыг phonetic чадвартай харьцуулахад ашигладаг. Бидний туршилтууд бидний шийдэл нь 2 хэл хоёр суурь шугам дээр 1.3-1.5 BLEU-г сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'Poprzednie badania wykazały, że dynamiczna kompresja dźwięku wejściowego przez telefon jest korzystna dla tłumaczenia mowy (ST). Wymagały one jednak dedykowanego modelu do rozpoznawania telefonu i nie testowały tego rozwiązania dla bezpośredniego ST, w którym jeden model tłumaczy dźwięk wejściowy na język docelowy bez pośrednich reprezentacji. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy pierwszą metodę zdolną do wykonania dynamicznej kompresji wejścia w bezpośrednich modelach ST. W szczególności wykorzystujemy Connectionist Temporal Classification (CTC) do kompresji sekwencji wejściowej zgodnie z jego charakterystyką fonetyczną. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że nasze rozwiązanie przynosi poprawę BLEU 1.3-1.5 nad silną bazą bazową dwóch par językowych (angielsko-włosko i angielsko-niemiecki), kontekstowo zmniejszając ślad pamięci o ponad 10%.', 'no': 'Førre studiar viste at ein dynamisk komprimering av inndatalyden er nyttig for taleomsetjing (ST). Dei krevde imidlertid eit spesifisert modell for telefonerkjenning, og test a ikkje denne løysinga for direkte ST, der ein enkel modell oversetter inndata-lyden til målspråket utan middelrepresentasjonar. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi den første metoden som kan utføra ein dynamisk komprimering av inndata i direkte ST-modeller. I særskilt bruker vi tilkoplingsglassifikasjonen (CTC) for å komprimera inndata-sekvensen etter sin fonetiske karakteristikk. Eksperimentane våre viser at løsningen vårt gjer ein 1,3-1,5 BLEU-forbedring over ein sterk baseline på to språkopar (engelsk-italiansk og engelsk-tysk), samtidig reduserer minneteksten med mer enn 10%.', 'ro': 'Studiile anterioare au demonstrat că o compresie dinamică informată prin telefon a sunetului de intrare este benefică pentru traducerea vorbirii (ST). Cu toate acestea, au necesitat un model dedicat pentru recunoașterea telefonului și nu au testat această soluție pentru ST direct, în care un singur model traduce sunetul de intrare în limba țintă fără reprezentări intermediare. În această lucrare, propunem prima metodă capabilă de a efectua o compresie dinamică a intrării în modele ST directe. În special, exploatăm clasificarea temporală conexionistă (CTC) pentru a comprima secvența de intrare în funcție de caracteristicile fonetice. Experimentele noastre demonstrează că soluția noastră aduce o îmbunătățire de 1,3-1,5 BLEU față de o bază puternică pe două perechi de limbi (engleză-italiană și engleză-germană), reducând contextual amprenta memoriei cu mai mult de 10%.', 'sr': 'Prethodno ispitivanje pokazalo je da je dinamična kompresija zvuka unosa korisna za prevod govora (ST). Međutim, oni su zahtevali posebni model za prepoznavanje telefona i nisu testirali ovu rešenje za direktno ST, u kojem jedan model prevodi ulazni audio u ciljni jezik bez međuvremenih predstavljanja. U ovom poslu predlažemo prvu metodu koja može izvesti dinamičnu kompresiju ulaza u direktne ST modele. Posebno, iskorištavamo temporalnu klasifikaciju vezivača (CTC) da kompresiramo ulaznu sekvencu prema svojim fonetičkim karakteristikama. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da naše rješenje donosi poboljšanje BLEU-a od 1,3-1,5 na snažnu početnu liniju na dva jezička parova (engleski-italijanski i engleski-nemački), u kontekstu smanjuje otisak pamćenja za više od 10%.', 'si': 'මුලින් පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරකාශ කරලා තියෙනවා කියලා ඇතුළත් අඩියෝගේ සංකුණු සංකුණයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා  ඒත් ඔවුන් ෆෝන් එක්ක අඳුරගන්න ප්\u200dරතිශ්නයක් අවශ්\u200dයය කරලා තියෙන්නේ නැහැ ST වෙනුවෙන් මේ විසරණය පරීක්ෂා කරලා තියෙන මේ වැඩේ අපි පලවෙනි විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරන්න පුළුවන් විදියට ST විදියට ඇතුල් එක්ක සංකුණයක් කරන්න. විශේෂයෙන්, අපි සම්බන්ධ කාර්යාන්ත්\u200dරික කාර්යාලය (CTC) විශේෂය කරනවා ඇතුළු කාර්යාලය සඳහා ඇතුළු ක්\u200dරමණය අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විස්තරය 1.3-1.5 BLUE විස්තරයක් භාෂාවක් දෙකක් වලින් වඩා ශක්තිමත් පරීක්ෂණය (ඉංග්\u200dරීස්-ඉංග්\u200dරීසි', 'sv': 'Tidigare studier visade att en dynamisk telefoninformerad komprimering av ingångsljudet är fördelaktig för talöversättning (ST). De krävde dock en särskild modell för telefonigenkänning och testade inte denna lösning för direkt ST, där en enda modell översätter ingångsljudet till målspråket utan mellanliggande representationer. I detta arbete föreslår vi den första metoden som kan utföra en dynamisk komprimering av ingången i direkta ST-modeller. I synnerhet utnyttjar vi Connectionist Temporal Classification (CTC) för att komprimera ingångssekvensen enligt dess fonetiska egenskaper. Våra experiment visar att vår lösning ger en förbättring på 1,3-1,5 BLEU jämfört med en stark baslinje på två språkpar (engelsk-italienska och engelsk-tyska), vilket kontextuellt minskar minnesavtrycket med mer än 10%.', 'so': 'Waxbarashada hore waxay muujinaysay in tarjumaadda hadalka (ST) uu faa’iido u leeyahay daboolka telefoonka ee warqadda lagu ogeysiiyey. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxay u baahan jireen tusaale gaar ah oo ay u baahan yihiin aqoonsashada telefoonka, mana ay tijaabin xafiiska tooska ah ee ST, kaas oo model keliya ayaa ku turjumaya codka input-ka oo ku qoran luqada waxqabadka ee loogu talagalay iyadoon u baahnayn noocyo dhexe ah. Markaas waxan, waxaynu horumarinaynaa qaabka ugu horeeya oo awoodi karnaa inaad sameyn karto daboolka saxda ee gudaha si toos ah u sameynta samooyinka ST. Si gaar ah, waxaynu isticmaalaynaa fasaxa waqtiga (CTC) si aan u koobanno nidaamka input-ga si waafaqsan tababarka telefonetka. Imtixaankayada waxay caddaysaa in xafiiska xusuustayadu uu keenaa 1.3-1.5 BLEU horumarinta si xoog leh oo ku qoran labada labo luqadood (Ingiriis-Talyaani iyo Ingiriis-Jarmal), marka ugu dambeysana waxay hoosaysiiyaan calaamada xusuusta oo ay ka badan 10 boqolkiiba.', 'ta': 'முந்தைய ஆய்வுகள் உள்ளீட்டு ஒலியோவின் தொலைபேசி அறிவிப்பு சுருக்கத்தை தெரிவித்துள்ளார் ஆனால், அவர்கள் தொலைபேசி அடையாளமுக்கு தனிப்பட்ட மாதிரி தேவை இந்த வேலையில், நாம் முதல் முறைமையை நேரடி ST மாதிரிகளில் உள்ளீட்டை செயல்படுத்த முடியும் குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் இணைப்பாளர் தற்காலிக வகுப்பு (CTC) பயன்படுத்தி உள்ளீடு வரிசையை அதன் போன்டெட்டிக் குறிப்புகளை பொருத்து. எங்கள் சோதனைகள் தீர்வு 1.3-1.5 பிலியு முன்னேற்றத்தை காண்பிக்கிறது இரண்டு மொழி ஜோடிகள் மீது வலுவான அடிப்படையில் மேம்படுத்தும் (ஆங்கிலத்தில்- ஆங்', 'ur': 'اگلے مطالعہ دکھائے گئے کہ انپیٹ آڈیو کے ایک ڈینمانیک فون سے خبردار کیا گیا ہے (ST) کلام کی ترجمہ کے لئے فائدہ اچھا ہے۔ لیکن انہوں نے فون کی شناسی کے لئے ایک مقرر موڈل کی ضرورت نہیں کی اور یہ حل مستقیم ST کے لئے امتحان نہیں کی، جہاں ایک موڈل نے اینٹ اوڈیو کو موجود زبان میں متوسط نمائش کے بغیر ترجمہ کیا ہے. ہم اس کام میں پہلی طریقہ پیشنهاد کریں گے کہ مستقیم ST موڈل میں ایک داینامیک کمپٹ کر سکیں۔ مخصوصا، ہم نے اتصال کرنے والے Temporal Classification (CTC) کو استعمال کرتا ہے تاکہ اس کے فونیٹ خصوصیات کے مطابق input sequence کو مضبوط کریں. ہماری آزمائش دکھاتی ہے کہ ہمارا حل 1.3-1.5 BLEU کو دو زبان جوڑوں پر مضبوط بنسلین (انگلیسی-ایتالیایی اور انگلیسی-جرمانی) کے ذریعہ سے زیادہ کم کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Oldingi taʼminlovlar roʻyxatini koʻrsatish mumkin, kiritish muvaffaqiyatli telefon tizimi (ST) tarjima qilish uchun foydalanadi. Lekin ular telefon tasdiqlash uchun qo'llangan model kerak va bu usulni direkt ST uchun tekshirilmaydi. Bu yerda bitta model o'zgarish mumkin. Bu ishda biz direktoriya ST modellarida kiritish natijasini bajarish uchun birinchi usulni talab qilamiz. Ko'rsatganda, biz fonetik xizmatlari sifatida kiritish seksiyatini murojaat qilamiz. Bizning imtiyozlarimiz 1.3-1.5 BLEU o'zgarishni ko'rsatadi, ikki tillar ikki xil (Ingliz-Taliy va Ingliz tilida Inglizcha-Olmoncha) bilan yaxshi darajada o'zgarishga ega bo'ladi, bizning xotira foydalanishimizni 10% dan ortiq ko'proq ko'rinadi.", 'vi': 'Những nghiên cứu trước đã chứng minh rằng một sự nén được thông tin điện thoại động về âm thanh nhập có lợi cho dịch giọng nói (ST). Tuy nhiên, họ cần một mô hình đặc biệt để nhận diện điện thoại và không thử giải này cho T trực tiếp, trong đó một mô hình duy nhất dịch âm thanh nhập vào ngôn ngữ đích mà không có các biểu hiện trung ương. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị phương pháp đầu tiên có thể thực hiện một nén động các nhập trong các mô hình ST trực tiếp. Đặc biệt, chúng tôi tận dụng Việc cấp thời gian Kết nối (CTC) để ép chuỗi nhập theo tính năng của nó. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi chứng minh giải pháp này mang đến một cải tiến 1.3-1.5 trên một nền tảng vững chắc trên hai cặp ngôn ngữ (Anh-Ý và Anh-Đức), nhằm đồng thời giảm áp lực lượng bộ nhớ bằng hơn mười.', 'nl': 'Eerdere studies toonden aan dat een dynamische telefoon-geïnformeerde compressie van de input audio gunstig is voor spraak translation (ST). Ze hadden echter een specifiek model nodig voor telefoonherkenning en hebben deze oplossing niet getest voor directe ST, waarbij een enkel model de input audio vertaalt naar de doeltaal zonder tussenliggende representaties. In dit werk stellen we de eerste methode voor om een dynamische compressie van de input uit te voeren in directe ST modellen. Met name gebruiken we de Connectionist Temporal Classification (CTC) om de invoersequentie te comprimeren volgens zijn fonetische kenmerken. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat onze oplossing een 1.3-1.5 BLEU-verbetering oplevert ten opzichte van een sterke baseline op twee taalparen (Engels-Italiaans en Engels-Duits), waardoor de geheugenvoetafdruk contextueel met meer dan 10%.', 'bg': 'Предишни проучвания показват, че динамичното телефонно информирано компресиране на входното аудио е полезно за речния превод (СТ). Въпреки това, те изискват специален модел за разпознаване на телефона и не тестват това решение за директен ST, в който един модел превежда входното аудио на целевия език без междинни изображения. В тази работа се предлага първият метод, способен да извърши динамично компресиране на входа в директни СТ модели. По-специално, ние използваме Временната Класификация на Временната Временна Класификация, за да компресираме входната последователност според нейните фонетични характеристики. Нашите експерименти показват, че нашето решение води до подобрение 1.3-1.5 спрямо силна базова база на две езикови двойки (английски-италиански и английски-немски), като контекстуално намалява отпечатъка на паметта с повече от 10%.', 'da': 'Tidligere undersøgelser viste, at en dynamisk telefonorienteret komprimering af indgangslyden er gavnlig for taleoversættelse (ST). De krævede dog en dedikeret model til telefongenkendelse og testede ikke denne løsning for direkte ST, hvor en enkelt model oversætter input lyden til målsproget uden mellemliggende repræsentationer. I dette arbejde foreslår vi den første metode, der er i stand til at udføre en dynamisk kompression af input i direkte ST modeller. Især udnytter vi Connectionist Temporal Classification (CTC) til at komprimere input sekvensen i henhold til dens fonetiske egenskaber. Vores eksperimenter viser, at vores løsning giver en 1,3-1,5 BLEU-forbedring i forhold til en stærk baseline på to sprogpar (engelsk-italiensk og engelsk-tysk), hvilket kontekstuelt reducerer hukommelsesmængden med mere end 10%.', 'de': 'Frühere Studien zeigten, dass eine dynamische telefongestützte Komprimierung des Eingangsaudios für die Sprachübersetzung (ST) von Vorteil ist. Allerdings benötigten sie ein dediziertes Modell zur Telefonerkennung und testeten diese Lösung nicht für Direct ST, bei dem ein einziges Modell das Eingangsaudio ohne Zwischenrepräsentationen in die Zielsprache übersetzt. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir die erste Methode vor, die in der Lage ist, eine dynamische Kompression des Eingangs in direkten ST-Modellen durchzuführen. Insbesondere nutzen wir die Connectionist Temporal Classification (CTC), um die Eingangssequenz entsprechend ihrer phonetischen Eigenschaften zu komprimieren. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass unsere Lösung eine 1.3-1.5 BLEU-Verbesserung gegenüber einer starken Baseline auf zwei Sprachpaaren (Englisch-Italienisch und Englisch-Deutsch) bringt und den Speicherbedarf kontextuell um mehr als 10%.', 'hr': 'Prethodna ispitivanja pokazala su da je dinamična kompresija zvuka unosa korisna za prevod govora (ST). Međutim, oni su zahtijevali posebni model za priznanje telefona i nisu testirali ovu rješenje za direktno ST, u kojem jedan model prevodi ulazni audio na ciljni jezik bez prosječnih predstavljanja. U ovom poslu predlažemo prvu metodu koja može izvršiti dinamičnu kompresiju ulaza u direktne ST modele. Posebno, iskorištavamo temporalnu klasifikaciju vezivača (CTC) kako bi kompresirali ulaznu sekvencu u skladu s njegovim fonetičkim karakteristikama. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da naše rješenje donosi poboljšanje 1,3-1,5 BLEU-a nad jakom početnom linijom na dva jezička parova (engleski-italijanski i engleski-njemački), u kontekstu smanjuje otisak sjećanja za više od 10%.', 'sw': 'Tafiti zilizopita zilionyesha kuwa shinikizo la simu zilizoripotiwa na habari za sauti za input ni faida kwa kutafsiri hotuba (ST). Hata hivyo, walihitaji mtindo maalumu wa kutambua simu na hawakujaribu suluhisho hili kwa ajili ya ST moja kwa moja, ambapo mfumo mmoja unatafsiri sauti ya input katika lugha ya lengo bila uwakilishi wa kati. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza mbinu ya kwanza za kutekeleza shinikizo la kisiasa la input katika mifano ya moja kwa moja. Kwa hakika, tunatumia utaratibu wa muda mfupi wa kuunganisha uhusiano (CTC) ili kuzuia mfululizo wa input kwa mujibu wa utaalam wake wa simu za mkononi. Our experiments demonstrate that our solution brings a 1.3-1.5 BLEU improvement over a strong baseline on two language pairs (English-Italian and English-German), contextually reducing the memory footprint by more than 10%.', 'tr': '횜흫ki ara힊tyrmalar (ST) 챌yky힊 terjime 체챌in bir dinamik telefon bilen baglan첵an ses basyrlygyny g철rkezildi. 횦철ne, telefon tanamak 체챌in bir nusga gerek we bu 챌철z체mi direkt ST 체챌in synamadylar. Bu nusga 첵eke bir nusga bizi흫 maksady diline ge챌iril첵채r. Bu i힊de biz ST nusgalarynda dinamik bir sykyny edip bilmek 체챌in ilkinji y철ntemi teklip ed첵채ris. A첵ratyn fa첵llary g철r채, Ba힊lyg zamanlary tertiblemek 체챌in (CTC) giri힊i tertiblemesini phonetik karakterlere g철r채 ulan첵arys Bizi흫 deneylerimiz 챌철zg체miz 1.3-1.5 BLEU 2 dil 챌ift di흫e g체첵챌li baselini흫 체st체nde (i흫lis챌e-itali첵a we i흫lis챌e-nemes챌e) 첵체ze d체힊체rip bardygyny g철rke첵채rler.', 'af': "Vorige studie het bevestig dat 'n dinamiese foon- inligtige kompressie van die invoer oudio is nuttig vir woorde vertaling (ST). Maar hulle benodig 'n gespesifiseerde model vir foon herkening en het nie hierdie oplossing vir direk ST toets nie, waarin 'n enkele model vertaal die invoer oudio in die doel taal sonder middelste voorstellings. In hierdie werk, ons voorstel die eerste metode wat 'n dinamiese komprimering van die invoer in direk ST modelles kan uitvoer. Spesifieke, ons gebruik die Konnekteerder Temporale Klassifikasie (CTC) om die invoer reeks volgens sy fonetiese karakteristieke te komprimeer. Ons eksperimente wys dat ons oplossing 'n 1.3-1.5 BLEU verbetering oor 'n sterk basisline op twee taal paar (Engels-Italiese en Engels-Duits), omtrent die geheue voetskrif met meer as 10 % verduur.", 'ko': '이전 연구에 따르면 동적 전화 정보의 압축 입력 오디오는 음성 번역(ST)에 유리하다.그러나 그들은 전용 핸드폰 식별 모델이 필요하고direct ST에 대해 이 해결 방안을 테스트하지 않았다.direct ST에서 단일 모델은 입력 오디오를 목표 언어로 번역하고 중간 표시를 필요로 하지 않는다.이 작업에서 우리는 직접 ST 모델의 입력을 동적 압축할 수 있는 첫 번째 방법을 제시했다.특히 우리는 연결주의 시간 분류(CTC)를 이용하여 입력 서열의 음성 특징에 따라 이를 압축한다.우리의 실험에 따르면 우리의 해결 방안은 두 언어 대(영어-이탈리아어와 영어-독일어)에서 강력한 기선보다 1.3-1.5 BLEU 높아졌고 상하문에서 10% 이상의 메모리 점용을 감소시켰다.', 'fa': 'مطالعات قبلی نشان دادند که یک فشار با اطلاعات تلفن دینامیک از صدای ورودی برای ترجمه سخنرانی (ST) منافع است. ولی آنها یک مدل خاص برای شناسایی تلفن نیاز داشتند و این راه حل را برای ST مستقیم امتحان نکردند، در آن یک مدل صدای ورودی را بدون نمایش\u200cهای بین\u200cالمللی به زبان هدف تبدیل می\u200cکند. در این کار، ما اولین روش را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که بتوانیم یک فشار دینامیک از ورودی در مدل ST مستقیم انجام دهیم. مخصوصاً ما کلاس\u200cسازی Temporary Connectionist (CTC) را استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا ترکیب ورودی را بر اساس ویژگی\u200cهای فونیک آن فشار دهیم. آزمایش\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که راه حل ما بر روی یک خط بنیادی قوی بر دو جفت زبان (انگلیسی-ایتالیایی و انگلیسی-آلمانی) یک سودهای ۱.۳-۱.۵ BLEU را می\u200cرساند، در حالی که در حال حاضر، پایان حافظه را بیش از ۱۰ در', 'am': 'የቀድሞው ትምህርት፣ የድምፅ ድምፅ መግለጫ ለንግግር መግለጫ የሚጠቅመው (ST) የሚታወቀው ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን ለጥያቄ ማስታወቂያው የተለየ ሞዴል ያስፈልጋሉ፣ ይህንም መፍትሄ ለቀጥተኛ ST ያልሞከሩ ናቸው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ ውስጥ የፊተኛውን ሥርዓት በ ቀጥተኛ ST ሞዴል ውስጥ የሚቻለውን የድምፅ ጥምቀት ማድረግ እናስባለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ የግንኙነታችንን የጥምቀት ግንኙነት በፎንnetic ስርዓት ለመጨመር (CTC)ን እንፈልጋለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን የ1.3-1.5 ብሊዩን በሁለት ቋንቋዎች (እንግሊዘኛ-ጣሊያንኛ እና እንግሊዘኛ-ጀርመን) ላይ ብርቱ የደረጃ መደገፊያውን እንዲያሳየው ያሳያል፡፡', 'sq': 'Previous studies demonstrated that a dynamic phone-informed compression of the input audio is beneficial for speech translation (ST).  Megjithatë, ata kërkonin një model të përkushtuar për njohjen e telefonit dhe nuk e testuan këtë zgjidhje për ST të drejtpërdrejtë, në të cilën një model i vetëm përkthen audio të hyrjes në gjuhën e objektivit pa përfaqësime të ndërkohëshme. Në këtë punë, propozojmë metodën e parë të aftë për të kryer një komprim dinamik të hyrjes në modelet e drejtpërdrejta ST. Ne veçanërisht, ne shfrytëzojmë Klasifikimin Temporal të Lidhjes (CTC) për të kompresuar sekuencën e hyrjes sipas karakteristikave fonetike të saj. Eksperimentet tona demonstrojnë se zgjidhja jonë sjell një përmirësim prej 1.3-1.5 BLEU lidhur me një bazë të fortë në dy çifte gjuhësh (anglisht-italian dhe anglisht-gjerman), duke reduktuar në kontekst gjurmën e kujtesës me më shumë se 10%.', 'bn': 'পূর্ববর্তী গবেষণা প্রদর্শন করেছে যে ইনপুট অডিও-এর একটি ডাইনামিক ফোন-তথ্য সম্পাদনা বাক্য অনুবাদের জন্য উপকার। তবে তারা ফোন স্বীকারের জন্য একটি বিশেষ মডেল প্রয়োজন এবং সরাসরি ST এর জন্য এই সমাধান পরীক্ষা করেনি যেখানে একটি মডেল ইনপুট অডিও টার্গেট ভাষায় অনুবাদ এই কাজে আমরা প্রথম পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করছি যে সরাসরি ST মডেলে ইনপুটের ডায়ান্ডামিক কপ্রিপোর্ট করতে পারে। বিশেষ করে, আমরা সংযোগীতাবাদী টেম্পুরাল ক্লাসিকেশন (সিসি) ব্যবহার করি তার ফোনেটিক বৈশিষ্ট্য অনুসারে ইনপুটের সেকেন্সের Our experiments demonstrate that our solution brings a 1.3-1.5 BLEU improvement over a strong baseline on two language pairs (English-Italian and English-German), contextually reducing the memory footprint by more than 10%.', 'hy': 'Անցյալ ուսումնասիրությունները ցույց տվեցին, որ ներմուծի ձայնի դինամիկ ճնշում, որը տեղեկացված է հեռախոսի միջոցով, օգտակար է խոսքի թարգմանման (ՍՏ) համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, նրանք պահանջեցին հեռախոսային ճանաչման նվիրված մոդել և չփորձեցին այս լուծումը ուղղակի ՍՏ-ի համար, որտեղ մեկ մոդելը թարգմանում է մուտքային ձայնը նպատակային լեզու առանց միջնական ներկայացումների: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք առաջին մեթոդը, որը կարողանում է կատարել դինամիկ ճնշումը ներմուծը ուղղակի ՍՏ մոդելներում: In particular, we exploit the Connectionist Temporal Classification (CTC) to compress the input sequence according to its phonetic characteristics.  Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր լուծումը բերում է 1.3-1.5 ԲԼԵՎ բարելավումը երկու լեզվի զույգերի (անգլերեն-իտալիացի և անգլերեն-գերմանացի) վրա, որը կոնտեքստորեն նվազեցնում է հիշողության ոտքերը ավելի', 'bs': 'Prethodna ispitivanja pokazala su da je dinamična kompresija zvuka unosa korisna za prevod govora (ST). Međutim, oni su zahtijevali posebni model za priznanje telefona i nisu testirali ovu rješenje za direktno ST, u kojem jedan model prevodi ulazni audio na ciljni jezik bez prosječnih predstavljanja. U ovom poslu predlažemo prvu metodu koja može izvesti dinamičnu kompresiju ulaza u direktne ST modele. Posebno, iskorištavamo temporalnu klasifikaciju Connectionist (CTC) da kompresiramo ulaznu sekvencu prema njegovim fonetičkim karakteristikama. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da naše rješenje donosi poboljšanje 1,3-1,5 BLEU-a nad jakom početnom linijom na dva jezička parova (engleski-italijanski i engleski-nemački), u kontekstu smanjuje otisak sjećanja za više od 10%.', 'cs': 'Předchozí studie prokázaly, že dynamická komprese vstupního zvuku informovaná telefonem je výhodná pro překlad řeči (ST). Vyžadovali však speciální model pro rozpoznávání telefonu a netestovali toto řešení pro přímé ST, v němž jeden model překládá vstupní zvuk do cílového jazyka bez prostředních reprezentací. V této práci navrhujeme první metodu schopnou provést dynamickou kompresi vstupu v přímých ST modelech. Konkrétně využíváme Connectionistickou časovou klasifikaci (CTC) k kompresi vstupní sekvence podle jejích fonetických charakteristik. Naše experimenty ukazují, že naše řešení přináší 1.3-1.5 zlepšení BLEU oproti silné základní základně u dvou jazykových párů (anglicko-italsky a anglicko-němčina), což kontextově snižuje paměťovou stopu o více než 10%.', 'id': 'Previous studies demonstrated that a dynamic phone-informed compression of the input audio is beneficial for speech translation (ST).  Namun, mereka membutuhkan model dedikasi untuk pengenalan telepon dan tidak menguji solusi ini untuk ST langsung, di mana model tunggal menerjemahkan audio input ke bahasa sasaran tanpa representation intermedi. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan metode pertama yang mampu melakukan kompresi dinamik input dalam model ST langsung. In particular, we exploit the Connectionist Temporal Classification (CTC) to compress the input sequence according to its phonetic characteristics.  Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa solusi kami membawa peningkatan BLEU 1,3-1,5 atas dasar dasar yang kuat pada dua pasangan bahasa (Inggris-Italia dan Inggris-Jerman), secara kontekstual mengurangi jejak memori dengan lebih dari 10%.', 'fi': 'Aiemmat tutkimukset osoittivat, että puhelimella tapahtuva äänen dynaaminen pakkaaminen on hyödyllistä puheen kääntämiselle (ST). He tarvitsivat kuitenkin puhelintunnistukseen tarkoitetun mallin, eivätkä testanneet tätä ratkaisua suoralle ST:lle, jossa yksi malli kääntää tuloäänen kohdekielelle ilman väliesityksiä. Tässä työssä ehdotamme ensimmäistä menetelmää, joka kykenee tekemään dynaamisen kompression tuloista suorissa ST-malleissa. Hyödynnämme erityisesti Connectionistista aikaluokitusta (CTC) sisääntulosekvenssin pakkaamiseen sen foneettisten ominaisuuksien mukaan. Kokemuksemme osoittavat, että ratkaisumme tuo 1,3–1,5 BLEU-parannuksen vahvaan lähtötasoon verrattuna kahteen kielipariin (englanti-italia ja englanti-saksa), mikä vähentää muistijalanjälkeä kontekstuaalisesti yli 10%.', 'et': 'Varasemad uuringud näitasid, et sisendaudio dünaamiline telefoni põhjal tihendamine on kasulik kõnetõlkele (ST). Siiski vajasid nad spetsiaalset mudelit telefoni tuvastamiseks ja ei katsetanud seda lahendust otsese ST-i jaoks, kus üks mudel tõlgib sisendheli sihtkeelde ilma vahepealsete esitusteta. Käesolevas töös pakume välja esimese meetodi, mis suudab teha sisendi dünaamilist tihendamist otsese ST mudeli puhul. Eelkõige kasutame ühendusliku ajalise klassifikatsiooni (CTC) sisendjärjestuse tihendamiseks vastavalt selle foneetilistele omadustele. Meie eksperimendid näitavad, et meie lahendus toob kaasa 1,3–1,5 BLEU parenduse võrreldes tugeva lähtetasemega kahe keelepaari (inglise-itaalia ja inglise-saksa) puhul, vähendades kontekstis mälu jalajälge rohkem kui 10%.', 'ca': "Els estudis anteriors van demostrar que una compressió dinàmica de l'àudio d'entrada informada per telèfon és beneficiosa per la traducció de la voz (ST). No obstant això, necessitaven un model dedicat al reconeixement telèfonic i no van provar aquesta solució per ST direct a, en la qual un únic model traduis l'audio d'entrada al llenguatge d'objectiu sense representacions intermedies. En aquesta feina, proposem el primer mètode capaç de fer una compressió dinàmica de l'entrada en models ST directs. En particular, explotam la Classificació Temporal Connectionista (CTC) per comprimir la seqüència d'entrada segons les seves característiques fonètiques. Els nostres experiments demostren que la nostra solució porta una millora de 1,3-1,5 de la BLEU sobre una forta base basal en dos parells de llenguatges (anglès-italià i anglès-alemany), reduint contextualment la petjada de la memòria en més del 10%.", 'az': 'Əvvəlki təcrübələr təşkil etdi ki, giriş səsinin dinamik telefon bilən sıkıştırması (ST) sözlərin çevirilməsi üçün faydalandır. Lakin onlar telefon tanıması üçün müəyyən bir modeli istədilər və bu çözümü doğru ST üçün test etmədilər, içində bir modeli girdi audisini məqsəd dilinə araşdırmaq olmadan məqsəd dilinə çevirir. Bu işdə, bizim ilk metodumuzun düzgün ST modellərində girişin in dinamik kompresisini təklif edirik. Özellikle, fonetik xüsusiyyətlərə görə giriş sequencesini sıkıştırmaq üçün bağlantıcı Temporal Classification (CTC) istifadə edirik. Bizim təcrübələrimiz çətinliklərimiz 2 dil çift (İngilizce-İtalyan və İngilizce-Alman) ilə qüvvətli təcrübə üstündə 1.3-1.5 BLEU təcrübəsini göstərir, həmçinin hafıza ayaqlarını 10%-dən çox azaltır.', 'sk': 'Prejšnje študije so pokazale, da je dinamična kompresija vhodnega zvoka po telefonu koristna za govorno prevajanje (ST). Vendar pa so potrebovali namenski model za prepoznavanje telefona in te rešitve niso testirali za neposredno ST, v katerem en sam model prevaja vhodni zvok v ciljni jezik brez vmesnih predstavitev. V tem delu predlagamo prvo metodo, ki lahko izvede dinamično stiskanje vhoda v direktnih ST modelih. Zlasti izkoriščamo povezovalno časovno klasifikacijo (CTC) za stiskanje vhodnega zaporedja glede na njegove fonetične značilnosti. Naši eksperimenti dokazujejo, da naša rešitev prinaša 1,3-1,5 izboljšanje BLEU v primerjavi z močno osnovno osnovo na dveh jezikovnih pari (angleško-italijanščina in angleško-nemščina), kar kontekstualno zmanjša odtis spomina za več kot 10%.', 'ha': "@ action: button Amma, sun buƙata wani misali wanda aka ƙayyade wa ganin na telephone kuma ba su jarraba wannan sulfin wa shirya na S. tare da shi, wani motel na fassara sautin inputi cikin harshen wanda aka yi amfani da shi ba da shiryarwa guda. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buƙata hanyar farko da za'a iya iya samar da wata danni na dam-ƙari cikin motsi na daidaita. Kayyan, Munã amfani da Shirin Ayuka na Connection da ke Temam (ATC) dõmin mu ƙara matsayin cikin shirin ayuka da ke daidaita fassararsa. Our experiments demonstrate that our solution brings a 1.3-1.5 BLEU improvement over a strong baseline on two language pairs (English-Italian and English-German), contextually reducing the memory footprint by more than 10%.", 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive We proposal the first method to do a dynamics Compresion of the input in directive RT modes. Link Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk sawetara karo hal-kalulusi tanggal 1.3-1.5', 'he': 'מחקרים קודמים הראו שדחיסה דינמית מודיעה בטלפון של הקולנוע ההכניסה מועילה לתרגום הנאום (ST). בכל אופן, הם דורשים מודל מסור לזיהוי טלפון ולא בדקו את הפתרון הזה עבור ST ישיר, שבה מודל אחד מתרגם את הקולנוע הכניסה לשפה המטרה ללא מייצגים בינויים. In this work, we propose the first method able to perform a dynamic compression of the input in direct ST models.  במיוחד, אנו מנצלים את מסגרת הזמנית הקונקציוניסטית (Connectionist Temporal Classification - CTC) כדי ללחוץ את רצף הכניסה לפי האופיינים הפונטיים שלה. הניסויים שלנו מראים שהפתרון שלנו מביא שיפור BLEU 1.3-1.5 מעל בסיס חזק על שתי זוגות שפות (אנגלית-איטלקית ואנגלית-גרמנית), בהקשר המפחית את טביעת הזיכרון על יותר מ-10%.', 'bo': 'སྔོན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་ནས་གནད་སྡུད་ནས་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་སྒྲ་སྐད་ཀྱི་མཐར་འཁོར་ནི་ཕན་ཚུན་བསྐྱེད་ཡོད་པ(ST)། ཡིན་ནའང་དེ་དག་གི་ཁྱད་པར་ངོས་འཛིན་པར་དམིགས་འཛུགས་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཞིག་དགོས་པ་ལས་ ST་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་གིས་ཐད་ཀར་བརྟག་ཞིབ་མ་བྱེད་པར། དབ In this work, we propose the first method to perform a dynamic compression of the input in direct ST models. དམིགས་བསལ་ན། ང་ཚོས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་Temporary Classification (CTC)འདི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པ་དེ་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རྟགས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱིས་ནང་གི་གོ་རིམ ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གི་ཐབས་ཤེས་དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ཤེས་གཞན་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས། སྐད་རིགས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་གཞིའི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཞིག་ཏུ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ་ཞིག'}
{'en': 'Top-down Discourse Parsing via Sequence Labelling', 'pt': 'Análise de discurso de cima para baixo via rotulagem de sequência', 'es': 'Análisis del discurso de arriba hacia abajo mediante el etiquetado de secuencias', 'ar': 'تحليل الخطاب من أعلى إلى أسفل عبر وسم التسلسل', 'ja': 'シーケンスラベルを介したトップダウンのディスコース解析', 'zh': '因序列标签自上而下语解析', 'fr': "Analyse de discours descendante via l'étiquetage de séquence", 'hi': 'अनुक्रम लेबलिंग के माध्यम से ऊपर-नीचे प्रवचन पार्सिंग', 'ru': 'Анализ нисходящего дискурса с помощью маркировки последовательностей', 'ga': 'Parsáil dioscúrsa ón mbarr anuas trí Lipéadú Seicheamh', 'el': 'Ανάλυση συζήτησης από πάνω προς τα κάτω μέσω επισήμανσης ακολουθίας', 'hu': 'Felülről lefelé érkező diskurzus elemzés sorozatcímkézéssel', 'ka': 'სამუშაო დისკურსების პანელიზაცია', 'kk': 'Жоғары төмендегі дискурстарды реттеу жарлығымен талдау', 'mk': 'Разговарање од горе надолу преку етикетирање на секвенција', 'it': "Analisi del discorso dall'alto verso il basso tramite l'etichettatura di sequenza", 'lt': 'Iš viršaus į apačią diskurso analizavimas naudojant sekos ženklinimą', 'ml': 'മുകളില്\u200d- താഴെയുള്ള ഡിസ്കോര്\u200dസ് പാര്\u200dസ് ചെയ്യുന്നത് സെക്കന്\u200dസ് ലാബെലിങ്ങിന്\u200dറെ മുഖം', 'ms': 'Penghuraian Perilaku Atas-bawah melalui Labelling Sequence', 'pl': 'Odgórne analizowanie dyskusji poprzez etykietowanie sekwencji', 'mt': 'Analiżi tad-Diskors minn fuq għal isfel permezz tat-Tikkettar tas-Sekwenza', 'ro': 'Analizarea discursului de sus în jos prin etichetarea secvențelor', 'no': 'Tolking av oppgåve nedover via sekvensmerkelapp', 'si': 'පහළ පහළ විශ්වාස විශ්වාස කරන්න', 'sr': 'Нагоре доле проанализирање реција посредством напишања реција', 'so': 'Jardiinooyinka kor-hoose via Sequence Labelling', 'sv': 'Uppifrån och ner diskurstolkning via sekvensmärkning', 'ur': 'اوپر- نیچے دیسکورز پارسینگ سکوئنس لابلینگ کے ذریعہ', 'ta': 'மேல்- கீழ்நோக்கி பாசிங் செய்தல் வரிசையின் மூலம்', 'mn': 'Үүний доорх ярианы талдаа дарааллаар тайлбарлах', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Thu nhỏ trên xuống qua nhãn dãy', 'bg': 'Разглеждане на дискусиите отгоре надолу чрез етикетиране на последователността', 'hr': 'Očitanje priče na vrhu dolje putem oznake sekvence', 'da': 'Top-down diskurstolkning via sekvensmærkning', 'de': 'Top-down Diskurse Parsing über Sequenz Labelling', 'fa': 'گفتگوهای بالا پایین تحلیل از طریق برچسب سطح', 'ko': '서열 표기에 기초한 위에서 아래로 문장 분석', 'nl': 'Top-down discours parsen via sequence labelling', 'tr': 'Üst-aşak Sözleri Taýýarlama', 'sw': 'Kuchapisha Mazungumzo ya Juu chini kupitia mfululizo wa Mazungumzo', 'id': 'Diskusi Analisasi dari atas ke bawah melalui Label Sekuensi', 'af': 'Boonste Ondersoek Ondersoek Ondersoek deur Volgorde Etiket', 'sq': 'Diskutimi nga lart poshtë nëpërmjet Etiketimit të Sekuencës', 'am': 'undo-type', 'az': 'SńĪradan Etilm…ôsi vasit…ôsil…ô yuxarńĪ aŇüańüńĪ ńįnŇüallar', 'hy': 'Գլխավոր ներքև հաղորդագրություն վերլուծում հաջորդականության նշանների միջոցով', 'bn': 'Top-down Discourse Parsing via Sequence Labelling', 'bs': 'Proračuna diskusija na vrhu dolje preko etikete sekvence', 'cs': 'Rozpracování diskusí shora dolů prostřednictvím sekvenčního označování', 'et': 'Ülalt alla Diskursuse parsimine jada märgistamise abil', 'ca': "Analització del discurs de dalt a baix mitjançant l'etiqueta de la seqüència", 'fi': 'Ylhäältä alaspäin Keskustelun jäsentäminen sekvenssimerkinnän avulla', 'he': 'מעלה למטה', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'Learn Mode', 'sk': 'Razčlenitev diskurza z označevanjem zaporedja od zgoraj navzdol', 'bo': 'རྒྱབ་ལྗོངས་ཀྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་ལ་བསྟུན་ནས་སྦྱར་རྟགས་ཕྲེ་བ'}
{'en': 'We introduce a top-down approach to discourse parsing that is conceptually simpler than its predecessors (Kobayashi et al., 2020 ; Zhang et al., 2020). By framing the task as a sequence labelling problem where the goal is to iteratively segment a document into individual discourse units, we are able to eliminate the decoder and reduce the search space for splitting points. We explore both traditional recurrent models and modern pre-trained transformer models for the task, and additionally introduce a novel dynamic oracle for top-down parsing. Based on the Full metric, our proposed LSTM model sets a new state-of-the-art for RST parsing.', 'fr': "Nous introduisons une approche descendante de l'analyse du discours qui est conceptuellement plus simple que ses prédécesseurs (Kobayashi et al., 2020\xa0; Zhang et al., 2020). En définissant la tâche comme un problème d'étiquetage de séquence dont l'objectif est de segmenter de manière itérative un document en unités de discours individuelles, nous sommes en mesure d'éliminer le décodeur et de réduire l'espace de recherche pour les points de division. Nous explorons à la fois des modèles récurrents traditionnels et des modèles de transformateurs pré-entraînés modernes pour cette tâche, et nous introduisons également un nouvel oracle dynamique pour l'analyse descendante. Sur la base de la métrique complète, notre modèle LSTM proposé définit une nouvelle technologie de pointe pour l'analyse RST.", 'ar': 'نقدم نهجًا تنازليًا لتحليل الخطاب أبسط من الناحية المفاهيمية من سابقاتها (كوباياشي وآخرون ، 2020 ؛ تشانغ وآخرون ، 2020). من خلال تأطير المهمة كمشكلة تسمية تسلسل حيث يكون الهدف هو تقسيم المستند تكراريًا إلى وحدات خطاب فردية ، يمكننا التخلص من وحدة فك التشفير وتقليل مساحة البحث عن نقاط الانقسام. نستكشف كل من النماذج المتكررة التقليدية ونماذج المحولات الحديثة المدربة مسبقًا للمهمة ، بالإضافة إلى تقديم أوراكل ديناميكي جديد للتحليل التنازلي. استنادًا إلى المقياس الكامل ، يضع نموذج LSTM المقترح لدينا أحدث التقنيات لتحليل RST.', 'es': 'Introducimos un enfoque descendente para el análisis del discurso que es conceptualmente más simple que sus predecesores (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Al enmarcar la tarea como un problema de etiquetado de secuencias en el que el objetivo es segmentar iterativamente un documento en unidades de discurso individuales, podemos eliminar el decodificador y reducir el espacio de búsqueda para los puntos de división. Exploramos tanto los modelos recurrentes tradicionales como los modelos de transformadores preentrenados modernos para la tarea y, además, presentamos un novedoso oráculo dinámico para el análisis descendente. Basado en la métrica completa, nuestro modelo LSTM propuesto establece un nuevo estado de vanguardia para el análisis de RST.', 'pt': 'Introduzimos uma abordagem de cima para baixo para análise de discurso que é conceitualmente mais simples do que seus antecessores (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Ao enquadrar a tarefa como um problema de rotulagem de sequência, onde o objetivo é segmentar iterativamente um documento em unidades de discurso individuais, podemos eliminar o decodificador e reduzir o espaço de busca para pontos de divisão. Exploramos modelos recorrentes tradicionais e modelos modernos de transformadores pré-treinados para a tarefa e, adicionalmente, introduzimos um novo oráculo dinâmico para análise de cima para baixo. Com base na métrica Full, nosso modelo LSTM proposto define um novo estado da arte para análise RST.', 'ja': '私たちは、以前のものよりも概念的に単純なトップダウンの言説構文解析アプローチを導入します（ Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020 ）。ドキュメントを個々のディスカッション単位に繰り返しセグメント化することを目標としたシーケンスラベリング問題としてタスクをフレーム化することで、デコーダを排除し、分割ポイントの検索スペースを減らすことができる。従来のリカレントモデルと現代的な事前訓練された変圧器モデルの両方をタスクのために探索し、さらにトップダウン構文解析のための斬新なダイナミックオラクルを導入します。フルメトリックに基づいて、提案されたLSTMモデルは、RST構文解析のための新しい最先端を設定します。', 'ru': 'Мы вводим нисходящий подход к разбору дискурса, который концептуально проще, чем его предшественники (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Формируя задачу как задачу маркировки последовательности, где цель состоит в итерационном сегментировании документа на отдельные единицы дискурса, мы можем устранить декодер и уменьшить пространство поиска для разделения точек. Мы исследуем как традиционные рекуррентные модели, так и современные предварительно обученные модели трансформаторов для этой задачи, и дополнительно вводим новый динамический оракул для анализа сверху вниз. Основываясь на метрике Full, наша предлагаемая модель LSTM устанавливает новый современный стандарт для анализа RST.', 'zh': '引入一语解析法,略(Kobayashi前身2020; 张等,2020)。 因事为序,迭代分文档为独语单元,可以消解码器损拆分点之索。 寻旧贯及今变压器,引一以自上而下解析新型动预言机。 基于完指标,吾言 LSTM 为 RST 解析设新最先进之术。', 'hi': 'हम प्रवचन पार्सिंग के लिए एक शीर्ष-डाउन दृष्टिकोण पेश करते हैं जो अपने पूर्ववर्तियों की तुलना में वैचारिक रूप से सरल है (कोबायाशी एट अल। झांग एट अल., 2020)। एक अनुक्रम लेबलिंग समस्या के रूप में कार्य को तैयार करके जहां लक्ष्य व्यक्तिगत प्रवचन इकाइयों में एक दस्तावेज़ को पुनरावर्ती रूप से विभाजित करना है, हम डिकोडर को खत्म करने और विभाजन बिंदुओं के लिए खोज स्थान को कम करने में सक्षम हैं। हम कार्य के लिए पारंपरिक आवर्तक मॉडल और आधुनिक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित ट्रांसफॉर्मर मॉडल दोनों का पता लगाते हैं, और इसके अलावा शीर्ष-डाउन पार्सिंग के लिए एक उपन्यास गतिशील ओरेकल पेश करते हैं। पूर्ण मीट्रिक के आधार पर, हमारा प्रस्तावित एलएसटीएम मॉडल आरएसटी पार्सिंग के लिए एक नया अत्याधुनिक सेट करता है।', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach cur chuige ó bharr anuas maidir le parsáil dioscúrsa atá níos simplí go coincheapúil ná mar a bhí roimhe (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Tríd an tasc a chumadh mar fhadhb lipéadaithe seichimh ina bhfuil sé mar sprioc doiciméad a dheighilt go atriallach in aonaid dioscúrsa aonair, táimid in ann deireadh a chur leis an díchódóir agus an spás cuardaigh le haghaidh pointí scoilte a laghdú. Déanaimid iniúchadh ar shamhlacha athfhillteacha traidisiúnta agus ar mhúnlaí nua-aimseartha réamh-oilte claochladáin don tasc, agus chomh maith leis sin tugaimid isteach oracle dinimiciúil úr le haghaidh parsála ón mbarr anuas. Bunaithe ar an méadrach Iomlán, leagann ár múnla LSTM atá beartaithe córas nua den scoth le haghaidh parsáil RST.', 'el': 'Εισάγουμε μια προσέγγιση από πάνω προς τα κάτω στην ανάλυση του λόγου που είναι εννοιολογικά απλούστερη από τους προκατόχους του (Κομπαγιάσι κ.λ., 2020; Ζανγκ κ.λ., 2020). Με την πλαισίωση της εργασίας ως πρόβλημα επισήμανσης ακολουθίας όπου ο στόχος είναι η επαναλαμβανόμενη τμηματοποίηση ενός εγγράφου σε μεμονωμένες μονάδες συζήτησης, είμαστε σε θέση να εξαλείψουμε τον αποκωδικοποιητή και να μειώσουμε το χώρο αναζήτησης για διαχωριστικά σημεία. Εξετάζουμε τόσο τα παραδοσιακά επαναλαμβανόμενα μοντέλα όσο και τα σύγχρονα προ-εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα μετασχηματιστών για την εργασία, και επιπλέον εισάγουμε ένα νέο δυναμικό μαντείο για ανάλυση από πάνω προς τα κάτω. Με βάση την πλήρη μέτρηση, το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο θέτει μια νέα κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας για την ανάλυση RST.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ დავიყენებთ სამუშაო პროგორმა, რომელიც კონცექტურად უფრო მხოლოდ იქნება მისი წინასწინასწინასწინასწინასწინასწინასწინასწინასწინასწ სამუშაო პრობლემა როგორც წერტილის მარტივის პრობლემა, სადაც სამუშაო არის წერტილის განვითარებად დოკუმენტის განვითარება განვითარებაში, ჩვენ შეგვიძლია გამოწყენოთ დეკუმენტის და გამოწ ჩვენ განვაკვირდებით ორივე რეკურენტიური მოდელები და მოდინარე პრეტრანსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინსტრინს ჩვენი პროგრამეტრიკის ბაზაზე, ჩვენი პროგრამეტული LSTM მოდელის შესაძლებელია ახალი სტატის განსხვავება RST პასუციისთვის.', 'hu': 'A diskurzus elemzésének felülről lefelé irányuló megközelítését vezetjük be, amely fogalmilag egyszerűbb, mint elődeinek (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). A feladat sorozatcímkézési problémaként keretezésével, ahol a cél egy dokumentum iteratív szegmensezése egyes diskurzusi egységekre, képesek vagyunk megszüntetni a dekódolót és csökkenteni a keresési területet a felosztási pontok számára. Feltárjuk mind a hagyományos visszatérő modelleket, mind a modern, előre képzett transzformátormodelleket a feladathoz, továbbá új dinamikus orákulumot vezetünk be a felülről lefelé történő elemzéshez. A Full metrika alapján javasolt LSTM modellünk új korszerű RST elemzést állít be.', 'it': "Introduciamo un approccio dall'alto verso il basso al parsing del discorso che è concettualmente più semplice rispetto ai suoi predecessori (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Incorporando il compito come un problema di etichettatura di sequenza in cui l'obiettivo è segmentare iterativamente un documento in singole unità di discorso, siamo in grado di eliminare il decoder e ridurre lo spazio di ricerca per i punti di divisione. Esploriamo sia i modelli ricorrenti tradizionali che i moderni modelli di trasformatori pre-addestrati per il compito, e inoltre introduciamo un nuovo oracolo dinamico per l'analisi dall'alto verso il basso. Basato sulla metrica Full, il nostro modello LSTM proposto stabilisce un nuovo stato dell'arte per l'analisi RST.", 'lt': 'Įgyvendiname metodą „iš viršaus į apačią“ diskursų analizei, kuris yra koncepciškai paprastesnis nei jo ankstesnieji (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Nustatydami užduotį kaip sekos ženklinimo problem ą, kuria siekiama pakartotinai suskirstyti dokumentą į atskirus diskurso vienetus, galime pašalinti dekoderį ir sumažinti skaidymo taškų paieškos erdvę. Mes tiriame ir tradicinius pakartotinius modelius, ir šiuolaikinius iš anksto parengtus transformatorių modelius uždaviniui atlikti, ir papildomai pristatome naują dinamišką orakulį, skirtą iš viršaus į apačią analizuoti. Remiantis visais metriniais duomenimis, mūsų siūlomas LSTM modelis nustato naujausią RST analizavimo pažangą.', 'mk': 'We introduce a top-down approach to discourse parsing that is conceptually simpler than its predecessors (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020).  Со нацртање на задачата како проблем со етикетирање на секвенца каде целта е итеративно сегментирање на документот во индивидуални дискурсни единици, ние сме во можност да го елиминираме декодерот и да го намалиме просторот за пребарување за точки на поделба. Истражуваме традиционални рецидентни модели и модерни предобучени трансформаторски модели за задачата, и дополнително воведуваме нов динамичен оракл за анализирање горе надолу. Based on the Full metric, our proposed LSTM model sets a new state-of-the-art for RST parsing.', 'kk': 'Біз өзінің алдыңғыларынан қарапайым (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Тапсырманы реттеу жарлығының мәселесі ретінде, мақсатты құжатты бір дискурс бірліктеріне қайталау үшін, декодерді жою және бөлу нүктерінің іздеу орынын азайту мүмкін болады. Біз тапсырманың әдетті қайталану үлгілерін және қазіргі алдын- оқылған түріндіру үлгілерін зерттеп, және қосымша жоғары талдау үшін романдық динамикалық оракулы келтіреміз. Толық метрикалық түріне негізделген LSTM үлгісіміз RST талдау үшін жаңа орындау күйін орнатады.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan dari atas ke bawah untuk penghuraian bahasa yang secara konsep lebih mudah daripada terdahulu (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Dengan bingkai tugas sebagai masalah penandaan urutan dimana tujuan adalah untuk segmen secara berulang dokumen ke unit diskors individu, kita boleh hapuskan dekoder dan mengurangkan ruang gelintar untuk titik pecahan. Kami mengeksplorasi kedua-dua model berulang tradisional dan model pengubah praterlatih modern untuk tugas, dan tambahan memperkenalkan orakul dinamik baru untuk penghuraian atas-bawah. Based on the Full metric, our proposed LSTM model sets a new state-of-the-art for RST parsing.', 'mn': 'Бид түүний өмнөх хүмүүсээс илүү хялбар болсон ярианы талаар дээд доорх арга зам илэрхийлж байна (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Үүнийг дарааллын маркингийн асуудал болгоход зорилго нь баримтыг өөр хэлбэл хэлбэл хэвлэх нэгжүүдэд дахин хэлбэл хэвлэх гэсэн үг юм. Бид уламжлалт дахин дахин дахин загвар болон орчин үеийн дахин дахин сургалтын шилжүүлэгч загваруудыг судалж, мөн дээд доошоо хуваалцахын тулд шинэ динамик үгүйг тайлбарлаж байна. Мөн бүрэн метрийн үндсэнд бидний LSTM загвар RST хуваалцах үед шинэ урлагийн байр суурилуулагддаг.', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കാനുള്ള മുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും മുമ്പുള്ളവരെക്കാള്\u200d എളുപ്പമാണ് സംസാരിക്കുന്നത് (കൊബാഷി എറ്റ് അല്\u200d, 2020; Zhang et al, 2020). പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നതിനെ ഒരു സെക്കന്റ് ലേബിലിങ്ങ് പ്രശ്നമാക്കുന്ന പ്രശ്നമാക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d അതിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം വ്യക്തിപരമായി സംസാരിക്കുന്ന യൂണിറ്റ നമ്മള്\u200d പാര്\u200dജ്ജിന് പുന്നോട്ട് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലുകളും ആധുനിക പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലുകളും പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ മുകളില്\u200d പാര പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ മെട്രിക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ പ്രോദ്ദേശിച്ച LSTM മോഡല്\u200d RST പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിനുള്ള പുതിയ സ്ഥാനം-', 'no': 'Vi introduserer ein tilnærming på toppen ned for å tolka diskursar som er konseptuelt enklere enn forrigerande (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Ved å ramme oppgåva som eit problem med merkelappen i sekvens der målet er å segmentera eit dokument på nytt i individuelle diskurseiningar, kan vi eliminere dekoderen og redusera søkjemodus for delingspunkt. Vi utforskar både tradisjonelle gjentakelige modeller og moderne fortrengde transformeringsmodeller for oppgåva, og tillegg introduserer ein novel dynamisk orakel for tolking øvre ned. Basert på fullstendig metrisk, vår foreslått LSTM-modell bestemmer ein ny kunsttilstand for RST-tolking.', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy odgórne podejście do parsowania dyskursu, które jest koncepcyjnie prostsze niż jego poprzednicy (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Oprawiając zadanie jako problem etykietowania sekwencji, w którym celem jest iteracyjne segmentowanie dokumentu na poszczególne jednostki dyskursji, jesteśmy w stanie wyeliminować dekoder i zmniejszyć przestrzeń wyszukiwania dla podziału punktów. Badamy zarówno tradycyjne modele powtarzające, jak i nowoczesne wstępnie przeszkolone modele transformatorów do tego zadania, a dodatkowo wprowadzamy nowatorską wyrocznię dynamiczną do parsowania odgórnego. Opierając się na metryce Full, nasz proponowany model LSTM ustawia nowy stan sztuki dla parsowania RST.', 'ro': 'Introducem o abordare de sus în jos a analizării discursului care este conceptual mai simplă decât predecesorii săi (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Prin încadrarea sarcinii ca o problemă de etichetare a secvențelor în care scopul este de a segmenta iterativ un document în unități individuale de discurs, suntem capabili să eliminăm decodorul și să reducem spațiul de căutare pentru punctele de divizare. Explorăm atât modelele recurente tradiționale, cât și modelele moderne pre-instruite de transformatoare pentru această sarcină și introducem, în plus, un oracol dinamic nou pentru analizarea de sus în jos. Bazat pe metrica Full, modelul nostru LSTM propus stabilește o nouă stare de ultimă generație pentru analizarea RST.', 'mt': 'We introduce a top-down approach to discourse parsing that is conceptually simpler than its predecessors (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020).  Billi nħejju l-kompitu bħala problem a tat-tikkettar tas-sekwenza fejn l-għan huwa li jitqassam b’mod iterattiv dokument f’unitajiet individwali ta’ diskors, nistgħu neħħew id-dekoder u ninaqqsu l-ispazju tat-tiftix għall-punti ta’ qsim. Aħna nesploraw kemm mudelli rikorrenti tradizzjonali kif ukoll mudelli moderni ta’ trasformaturi mħarrġa minn qabel għall-kompitu, u addizzjonalment jintroduċu oraklu dinamiku ġdid għall-analiżi minn fuq għal isfel. Abbażi tal-metrika sħiħa, il-mudell LSTM propost tagħna jistabbilixxi avvanz ġdid għall-analiżi RST.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa hab-hoos ah oo ay ka sahlan yihiin baarkiisa hore (Kobayashi et al, 2020; Zhang et al, 2020). Markaas waxan ku burburin karnaa dhibaato ku qoran, kaas oo uu ku qoran yahay in dukumenti si rasmi ah looga qeybiyo qaybaha sheekeysiga oo gaarka ah, waxaynu awoodi karnaa in aan diidno oo aan hoos u dhigno goobta raadinta. Waxaynu baaraynaa noocyada dib u soo socda iyo qaababka la tababariyey ee hore, waxaana sidoo kale ku soo bandhigaynaa baaritaanka hoose-hoos. Sida uu ku saleysan dhamaan metrici, modelkeeni la soo jeeday LSTM wuxuu soo saaraa xaalad cusub oo u qoran baaritaanka RST.', 'ta': 'We introduce a top-down approach to discourse parsing that is conceptually simpler than its predecessors (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020).  இந்த செயலை ஒரு வரிசையான சிக்கல் பிரச்சினையாக பிரிக்கும் பொழுது, இலக்கு ஒரு ஆவணத்தை தனிப்பட்ட பேச்சு அலகுகளாக பிரிக்க முடியும், நாம் குறியீட்டை நீக் நாம் பாரம்பரிய மீண்டும் திரும்ப மாதிரிகளும் மற்றும் பணிக்கான தற்போதைய பயிற்சி மாற்றி மாதிரிகளும் மாதிரிகளையும் கண்டறிகிறோம். மே முழு மெட்ரிக் அடிப்படையில், எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட LSTM மாதிரி RST பாசிங்குக்கு புதிய நிலையின் கலை அமைக்கிறது.', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar ett uppifrån och ner förhållningssätt till diskurstolkning som är konceptuellt enklare än dess föregångare (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Genom att rama in uppgiften som ett sekvensmärkningsproblem där målet är att iterativt segmentera ett dokument i enskilda diskursenheter kan vi eliminera avkodaren och minska sökutrymmet för delningspunkter. Vi utforskar både traditionella återkommande modeller och moderna förutbildade transformatormodeller för uppgiften, och introducerar dessutom ett nytt dynamiskt orakel för uppifrån och ner tolkning. Baserat på Full metric sätter vår föreslagna LSTM-modell en ny state-of-the-art för RST-tolkning.', 'ur': 'ہم اس سے پہلے گزر جانے والوں سے زیادہ آسان باتوں کے بارے میں (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020) کے ذریعہ ایک بالا نیچے طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں۔ ٹاکس کو ایک سطح لابلینگ مسئلہ کے طور پر فرم کر کے جہاں موقع ایک دکھانے کے واحدوں میں ایک دکھانے کے واحدوں میں دوبارہ سپگٹ کرنا ہے، ہم دکھانے والے کو ہٹا سکتے ہیں اور تقسیم پوینٹوں کے لئے تلاش کی جگہ کم کر سکتے ہیں. ہم نے دنیا کے لئے سنتی دوبارہ ریٹرنٹ موڈل اور مدرنی پیش ترسینٹ ریٹرنٹ موڈل کو تحقیق کریں، اور اضافہ طور پر ایک نئی داینامی اوراکل کو ٹوپ-ڈون پارسینگ کے لئے پیش کریں۔ پول میٹریک پر بنیاد ہے، ہماری پیشنهاد LSTM موڈل RST پارسینگ کے لئے ایک نئی حالت-آرت کا مقرر کرتا ہے.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo vrhunski pristup razmatranju diskusija koji je konceptualno jednostavniji od prethodnika (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Smatrajući zadatak kao problem označavanja sekvence u kojem je cilj da ponovno segmentišemo dokument u pojedinačne diskurske jedinice, možemo eliminisati dekoder i smanjiti potragu za tačkama razdvajanja. Istražujemo i tradicionalne rekonstruirane modele i moderne predobučene transformacijske modele za zadatak, i dodatno predstavljamo novi dinamični orakul za parsanje vrha dole. Na osnovu kompletne metrike, naš predloženi LSTM model postavlja novo stanje umjetnosti za razmatranje RST-a.', 'si': 'අපි පිළිගන්නම් උපරිමින් පිළිගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ, ඒක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට වැඩියි (කොබායා ක්\u200dරියාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂ කතාවක් යුනිකයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ලෙබෙල අපි පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපි සම්පූර්ණ මෙට්\u200dරික් වලින්, අපේ ප්\u200dරාර්ථනා කරපු LSTM මොඩ්ලෙක් RST විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා අලුත් ස්ථිතියක් සැ', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một phương pháp tiếp cận từ trên xuống để phân tích thuyết trình, điều đó dễ hiểu hơn những gì đã xảy ra trước đây (Kobayashi ayeshi et al., 2020). Bằng cách sắp xếp nhiệm vụ như một vấn đề nhãn dãy nơi mục đích là phân chia văn bản thành các đơn vị biểu tình riêng, chúng ta có thể loại bỏ mật mã và giảm các khoảng trống tìm kiếm cho các điểm chia tách. Chúng ta khám phá cả những mô hình thường xuyên và những mẫu máy biến thế hiện đại được huấn luyện để thực hiện nhiệm vụ, và thêm vào đó sẽ có một nhà tiên tri mới cho phép phân tách. Dựa trên đo lường tổng quát, mô hình LSD đề nghị chúng tôi thiết lập một kiểu mới tinh vi phân tích RST.', 'uz': "Biz oldingizdan sodda bo'lgan gapirish uchun eng yuqori suhbatni ko'rsamiz (Kobayashi et al, 2020; Zhang et al, 2020). Vazifani cheksiz raqamli muammolar sifatida yaratish mumkin, qanday maqsadni bir xil talab aloqa bir xil aloqalarni birga ajratish mumkin, biz kodlash usulini olib tashlab boʻlishi mumkin. Biz vazifa uchun oddiy takrorlanadigan modellarni ko'rib chiqimiz va yangilikdan oldin o'zgarishlar modellarini o'rganamiz va qo'shish uchun yuqori chegara oramni o'rganamiz. Based on the Full metric, our proposed LSTM model sets a new state-of-the-art for RST parsing.", 'hr': 'Predstavljamo vrhunski pristup razmatranju diskusija koji je konceptualno jednostavniji od prethodnika (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Obračujući zadatak kao problem označavanja sekvence u kojem je cilj iterativno segmentirati dokument u pojedinačne diskurske jedinice, mi smo u mogućnosti eliminirati dekoder i smanjiti potražnju prostora za razdvajanje. Istražujemo i tradicionalne rekonstruirane modele i moderne predobučene transformacijske modele za zadatak, i dodatno predstavljamo novi dinamični orakul za vrhunski razmatranje. Na temelju pune metrike, naš predloženi LSTM model postavlja novo stanje umjetnosti za razmatranje RST-a.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer en top-down tilgang til diskursanalyse, der er konceptuelt enklere end dens forgængere (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Ved at indramme opgaven som et sekvensmærkningsproblem, hvor målet er iterativt at segmentere et dokument i individuelle diskursenheder, er vi i stand til at fjerne dekoderen og reducere søgepladsen for opdelingspunkter. Vi udforsker både traditionelle tilbagevendende modeller og moderne prætrænede transformatormodeller til opgaven, og introducerer desuden et nyt dynamisk orakel til top-down parsing. Baseret på Full metric, vores foreslåede LSTM model sætter en ny state-of-the-art for RST parsing.', 'bg': 'Въвеждаме подход отгоре надолу към анализирането на дискурса, който е концептуално по-прост от неговите предшественици (Кобаяши и др., 2020; Джан и др., 2020). Чрез оформянето на задачата като проблем за етикетиране на последователност, където целта е итеративно сегментиране на документ в отделни дискурсни единици, ние сме в състояние да елиминираме декодера и да намалим пространството за търсене за разделяне на точки. Ние изследваме както традиционните повтарящи се модели, така и модерните предварително обучени модели трансформатори за задачата, и допълнително въвеждаме нов динамичен оракул за анализ отгоре надолу. Въз основа на показателя "Пълен", нашият предложен модел определя ново състояние на изкуството за анализ на RST.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan dari atas ke bawah untuk menghurai diskors yang konsep lebih sederhana dari sebelumnya (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Dengan mengarangi tugas sebagai masalah penandaian urutan dimana tujuan adalah segmen iteratif dokumen ke unit diskors individu, kita dapat menghapuskan dekoder dan mengurangi ruang pencarian untuk titik perpisahan. We explore both traditional recurrent models and modern pre-trained transformer models for the task, and additionally introduce a novel dynamic oracle for top-down parsing.  Berdasarkan metrik penuh, model LSTM kami yang diusulkan menetapkan state-of-the-art baru untuk penghuraian RST.', 'nl': 'We introduceren een top-down benadering van discours parsing die conceptueel eenvoudiger is dan zijn voorgangers (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Door de taak te kaderen als een sequence labeling probleem waarbij het doel is om een document iteratief te segmenteren in individuele discours eenheden, zijn we in staat om de decoder te elimineren en de zoekruimte voor splitsing punten te verkleinen. We verkennen zowel traditionele terugkerende modellen als moderne voorgetrainde transformatormodellen voor deze taak, en introduceren daarnaast een nieuw dynamisch orakel voor top-down parsing. Gebaseerd op de Full metric, stelt ons voorgestelde LSTM model een nieuwe state-of-the-art voor RST parsing.', 'fa': 'ما یک روش بالا پایین برای پایین کردن گفتگوها را معرفی می کنیم که به نظر آسانتر از پیشینیان آن است (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). با فرم کردن این کار به عنوان مشکل برچسب برچسب برچسب\u200cهای برچسب جایی که هدف این است که یک سند را به واحدهای صحبت فردی برچسب کنیم، ما می\u200cتوانیم آن را از بین ببریم و فضای جستجو برای نقاط جدا کردن کاهش دهیم. ما هر دو مدل\u200cهای دوباره\u200cای سنتی و مدل\u200cهای تغییر\u200cپذیر پیش\u200cآموزش مدرن را برای این کار تحقیق می\u200cکنیم، و اضافه\u200cای از این مدل\u200cهای دوباره\u200cای را برای تحلیل\u200cپذیر بالا معرفی می\u200cکنیم. بر اساس متریک کامل، مدل LSTM پیشنهاد ما یک وضعیت جدید هنر برای تجزیه RST را تنظیم می کند.', 'sw': 'Tunaonyesha mbinu za juu za kuimba mazungumzo ambayo ni rahisi zaidi ya wale walio tangulia (Kobayashi et al, 2020; Zhang et al, 2020). Kwa kuvunja juhudi hili kama tatizo la kutangaza kwa mfululizo ambapo lengo la kutengeneza nyaraka kwa kiasi kikubwa katika viungo vya mazungumzo binafsi, tunaweza kuondoa kodi ya kupunguza na kupunguza nafasi ya kutafuta kwa ajili ya kupambanua pointi. Tunagundua mifano ya kawaida na mifano ya mabadiliko ya kisasa kwa ajili ya kazi hiyo, na kwa nyongeza tunaonyesha michoro ya kisasa yenye mabadiliko ya juu kwa ajili ya uchimbaji wa chini. Kutokana na mtiririko mzima, mtindo wetu unapendekezwa na LSTM unaweka hali mpya ya sanaa ya kuimba RST.', 'af': "Ons introduseer 'n bo-af toegang tot diskursie verwerking wat konseptieële eenvoudiger is as sy voorkomstakers (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Deur die taak as 'n volgorde etiketting probleem te raam waar die doel is om 'n dokument iteratief te segmenteer in individuele diskursie eenhede, is ons in staat om die dekoder te elimineer en die soektog spasie vir deling punte te verminder. Ons ondersoek beide tradisionele herhaalde modele en moderne voroerseerde transformeermodele vir die taak, en toeleggende introduseer 'n roman dinamiese orakel vir bo-af verwerking. Ons voorgestelde LSTM model stel 'n nuwe staat van die kuns vir RST-verwerking.", 'tr': 'Biz indiki ýokarydaky gezek öňki adamlaryndan has öňki gezek çykyşynyň(Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Görevi bir hatlary bejermek üçin bir sany etitleme meselesi häzirki maksadyň bir senedi birnäçe diskoýunlara terjime edip, çölme noktalary üçin gözlemek ýerini azaltyp bileris. Biz hem däpli çatan nusgalary hem modern öňünden öňünden öňünden geçirilen transformatör nusgalaryny keşfetýäris we üst-üst analysiýa üçin bir roman dinamik oraklygy tapdyryp bileris. Tam metriýa daýal, biziň LSTM nusgasymyz RST parslamak üçin täze bir ýagtylyk taýýarlanýar.', 'de': 'Wir führen einen Top-Down-Ansatz für Diskursparsing ein, der konzeptionell einfacher ist als seine Vorgänger (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Indem wir die Aufgabe als Sequenz-Beschriftungsproblem umrahmen, bei dem das Ziel besteht, ein Dokument iterativ in einzelne Diskurseinheiten zu segmentieren, können wir den Decoder eliminieren und den Suchraum für Trennpunkte reduzieren. Wir erforschen sowohl traditionelle wiederkehrende Modelle als auch moderne vortrainierte Transformatormodelle für diese Aufgabe und führen zusätzlich ein neuartiges dynamisches Orakel für Top-Down Parsing ein. Basierend auf der Full-Metrik setzt unser vorgeschlagenes LSTM-Modell einen neuen Stand der Technik für RST-Parsing.', 'sq': 'Ne futim një qasje nga lart poshtë për analizimin e diskurseve që është konceptualisht më e thjeshtë se paraardhësit e saj (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Duke e kornizuar detyrën si një problem të shënimit të sekuencës ku qëllimi është të segmentojmë përsëritur një dokument në njësi individuale diskursi, ne jemi në gjendje të eliminojmë dekoderin dhe të reduktojmë hapësirën e kërkimit për pikat e ndarjes. Ne eksplorojmë si modelet tradicionale të përsëritura dhe modelet moderne të transformuesve të paratrajnuar për detyrën dhe përveç kësaj prezantojmë një orakull dinamik të ri për analizimin nga lart poshtë. Bazuar në metrikën e plotë, modeli ynë i propozuar LSTM vendos një state-of-the-art të ri për analizimin RST.', 'am': 'ከቀድሞዎቹ ይልቅ ቀላል እናስባለን፡፡ አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር የባሕላዊ መደጋገሚያ ምሳሌዎች እና የአሁኑን ቀድሞ ተማሪ ለውጥ model እናደርጋለን፡፡ ሙሉ ሜትሪክ በመሠረት ላይ የተዘጋጀው LSTM ሞዴል የRST ማኅበረሰብ አዲስ የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-art ሁኔታ ያስተካክላል፡፡', 'az': 'Biz əvvəlkilərindən daha asanlıdır (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Gördüyünü seçmə etiketləmə problemi olaraq, məqsəd belə bir dəstəni individual diskurs birliklərinə təkrar segmentləndirməkdir, biz dekoderi silib ayırma nöqtələri üçün arama alanını azaltmayı başaraq. Biz hər ikisini təhsil edirik, hər ikisini təhsil edirik, həmçinin əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş transformer modellərini keşfetirik, həmçinin də üst a şağı təhsil üçün yeni dinamik oraklı təhsil edirik. Tam metrik üzərində, bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz LSTM modelimiz RST ayırılması üçün yeni bir məlumat təyin edir.', 'ko': '우리는 개념적으로 이전의 방법보다 더 간단하다(Kobayashi 등, 2020년, Zhang 등, 2020년).작업 프레임워크를 시퀀스 탭 문제로 바꾸는 것을 통해 문서를 개별적인 언어 단원으로 교체하는 것이 목표이며, 우리는 디코더를 제거하고 분할점의 검색 공간을 줄일 수 있다.우리는 전통적인 귀속 모델과 현대의 예비 훈련 변환기 모델을 탐색했고 새로운 동적oracle을 도입하여 위에서 아래로 해석했다.완전한 도량을 바탕으로 우리가 제시한 LSTM 모델은 RST 해석에 새로운 기술을 제공했다.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք խոսակցության վերևի վերևի վերևի մոտեցում, որը ըստ էության ավելի պարզ է, քան նախորդները (KOBAYASI et al., 2020; Ժանգ et al., 2020). By framing the task as a sequence labelling problem where the goal is to iteratively segment a document into individual discourse units, we are able to eliminate the decoder and reduce the search space for splitting points.  Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք նաև ավանդական կրկնօրինակ մոդելներ, նաև ժամանակակից նախապատրաստված վերափոխողների մոդելներ այս խնդրի համար, և նաև ներկայացնում ենք նոր դինամիկ օրակալ վերևի վերլուծության համար: Based on the Full metric, our proposed LSTM model sets a new state-of-the-art for RST parsing.', 'bn': 'আমরা কথোপকথন পার্গারের জন্য একটি শীর্ষ পদক্ষেপ উপস্থাপন করেছি যা তার পূর্ববর্তীদের চেয়ে সহজ। By framing the task as a sequence labelling problem where the goal is to iteratively segment a document into individual discourse units, we are able to eliminate the decoder and reduce the search space for splitting points.  আমরা ঐতিহ্যবাহী পুনরাবারের মডেল এবং কাজের জন্য আধুনিক প্রশিক্ষিত প্রাক্তন পরিবর্তনের মডেল খুঁজে বের করি এবং এছাড়াও একটি নভেল পার্জিং এর জন্য একটি  পুরো মেট্রিক ভিত্তিতে, আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত এলএসএম মডেল আরস্ট পার্জিং এর জন্য নতুন রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প নির্ধারণ করে।', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo vrhunski pristup razmatranju diskusija koji je konceptualno jednostavniji od prethodnika (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Obračujući zadatak kao problem označavanja sekvence u kojem je cilj iterativno segmentirati dokument u pojedinačne diskurske jedinice, možemo eliminirati dekoder i smanjiti prostor potražnje za dijelovima. Istražujemo i tradicionalne rekonstruirane modele i moderne predobučene transformacijske modele za zadatak, i dodatno predstavljamo novi dinamični orakul za analizu vrha dolje. Na temelju pune metrike, naš predloženi LSTM model postavlja novo stanje umjetnosti za razmatranje RST-a.', 'cs': 'Představujeme shora dolů přístup k analýze diskurzu, který je koncepčně jednodušší než jeho předchůdci (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Rámováním úkolu jako problému sekvenčního označování, kde je cílem iterativně segmentovat dokument do jednotlivých diskurzních jednotek, jsme schopni eliminovat dekodér a snížit prostor pro vyhledávání pro dělení bodů. Prozkoumáme pro tento úkol tradiční recidivní modely i moderní předcvičené transformátorové modely a navíc představujeme nové dynamické věštce pro analýzu shora dolů. Náš navržený model LSTM, založený na metrice Full, nastavuje nový stav techniky pro analýzu RST.', 'ca': "Introduïm un enfocament de dalt a baix per l'analització de discurs que és conceptualment més simple que els seus predecessors (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Quadrant la tasca com un problem a d'etiquetar seqüència on l'objectiu és segmentar iterativament un document en unitats de discurs individuals, podem eliminar el decodificador i reduir l'espai de cerca per punts de divisió. Explorem tant models tradicionals recurrents com models moderns de transformadors pré-entrenats per a la tasca, i també introduïm un oracle dinàmic nou per l'analització de dalt a baix. Sobre la base de la Mètrica Completa, el nostre model LSTM proposat estableix una nova tecnologia de l'analització RST.", 'et': 'Tutvustame diskursuse parsimisele ülalt alla lähenemisviisi, mis on kontseptuaalselt lihtsam kui selle eelkäijad (Kobayashi jt., 2020; Zhang jt., 2020). Kui kujundame ülesande järjestuse märgistamise probleemina, mille eesmärk on dokument iteratiivselt segmenteerida individuaalseteks diskursusüksusteks, suudame dekoodri kõrvaldada ja jagamispunktide otsinguruumi vähendada. Uurime ülesandeks nii traditsioonilisi korduvaid mudeleid kui ka kaasaegseid eelnevalt koolitatud transformaatorite mudeleid ning lisaks tutvustame uudset dünaamilist oraakklit ülevalt alla parsimiseks. Täismeetrile tuginedes kehtestab meie pakutud LSTM mudel RST parsimise uue taseme.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme ylhﾃ､ﾃ､ltﾃ､ alaspﾃ､in suuntautuvan lﾃ､hestymistavan diskurssin jﾃ､sentﾃ､miseen, joka on kﾃ､sitteellisesti yksinkertaisempi kuin edeltﾃ､jﾃ､nsﾃ､ (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Kehittﾃ､mﾃ､llﾃ､ tehtﾃ､vﾃ､n sekvenssimerkintﾃ､ongelmaksi, jossa tavoitteena on segmentoida dokumentti iteratiivisesti yksittﾃ､isiin diskurssiyksikﾃｶihin, pystymme poistamaan dekooderin ja vﾃ､hentﾃ､mﾃ､ﾃ､n jakopisteiden hakua. Tutkimme tehtﾃ､vﾃ､ﾃ､n sekﾃ､ perinteisiﾃ､ toistuvia malleja ettﾃ､ moderneja esikoulutettuja muuntajamalleja, ja lisﾃ､ksi esittelemme uuden dynaamisen oraakkelin ylhﾃ､ﾃ､ltﾃ､ alaspﾃ､in jﾃ､sentﾃ､miseen. Full-metriikkaan perustuen ehdotettu LSTM-malli asettaa RST-jﾃ､sentﾃ､miseen uuden state-of-the-art.', 'ha': "Tuna fara wani takwara da aka samu zuwa ga mazaɓa masu faɗi wanda ke da shi na gaba (Kobayashi et al, 2020; Zhang et al, 2020). Ga ku buɗe aikin a matsayin mai dubi'a, inda goa ya zama wajen raba wata takarda cikin sunaye guda, za'a iya cire kode kodi kuma mu ƙara filin da ake nuna wa point-taraki. Munã jarraba misãlai da aka sake a cikin aikin da aka riga wa kwanan da aka taɓa wa zaman mai musanya na aikin, kuma Mu ƙara wani sauri na danganiya na sauran da aka samu-sami. Basan da aka cikakken Metric, misalinmu na LTRM da aka buƙata yana daidaita wata halin-sanar wa-da-yi wa parse-RS.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo pristop zgoraj navzdol k razčlenjevanju diskurza, ki je konceptualno preprostejši od njegovih predhodnikov (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). Z oblikovanjem naloge kot problem označevanja zaporedja, kjer je cilj iterativno segmentiranje dokumenta v posamezne diskurzne enote, lahko odstranimo dekoder in zmanjšamo iskalni prostor za razdelitve točk. Za to nalogo raziskujemo tako tradicionalne ponavljajoče se modele kot sodobne predhodno usposobljene transformatorske modele, poleg tega pa predstavimo nov dinamični orakel za razčlenitev zgoraj navzdol. Naš predlagani model LSTM, ki temelji na merilu Full, postavlja nov najsodobnejši razčlenitev RST.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་མཐོང་སྣེ་མཐོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་མ་བཤད་པའི་སྐད་འགའ་བྱ་ཚིགས་འདི་སྔོན་གྱི་མ་ཚོགས་ལས་ལས་སླ་གཏོང་མྱོང་། By framing the task as a sequence labelling problem where the goal is to iteratively segment a document into individual discourse units, we are able to eliminate the decoder and reduce the search space for splitting points. ང་ཚོས་དུས་མཐུན་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་དང་དུས་ཚོད་ལས་སྔོན་གྲངས་འཛིན་པའི་དཔེ་གཞི་རྣམ་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱང་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱང་མཐོང Based on the Full metric, our proposed LSTM model sets a new state-of-the-art for RST parsing.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים גישה מעל למטה לאבחן דיבורים שפשוטה מבחינה מוחשית יותר מאשר קודמותיו (Kobayashi et al., 2020; Zhang et al., 2020). על ידי המסגרת את המשימה בתור בעיית סימני רצף היכן המטרה היא לחלק באופן חוזר מסמך ליחידות דיבורים בודדות, אנחנו מסוגלים להסיר את הקודר ולפחות את מרחב החיפוש לנקודות נפרדות. אנו חוקרים שני דוגמנים מסורתיים חוזרים ומודלים מודרניים של מעבר מודרניים למשימה, ובנוסף להציג אורקל דינמי חדש עבור בדיקת מעל למטה. בהתבסס על המטריקה המלאה, מודל LSTM המוצע שלנו קובע מצב חדש של האמנות עבור בדיקת RST.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggawe aturan top-down diagram kanggo nggawe geraraning nggawe barang kelas barang nggawe barang nggawe barang seneng nggawe barang kejahatan (Kobayasii et al, 2020; Jang et al, 2020). ProgressBar Awakdhéwé éntuk perusahaan model sing perusahaan karo model sing nyeangno karo model sing karo nggawe barang nggawe lanjut, lan nambah kebebasan perusahaan dynamics dumadhil kanggo kalagayaan top-down NgaNgawe Perintah Full Metric, kita nambah model LTT iki dadi sistem bagian-tanggal kanggo tarjamahan'}
{'en': 'Neural Data-to-Text Generation with LM-based Text Augmentation', 'es': 'Generación de datos neuronales a texto con aumento de texto basado en LM', 'fr': 'Génération de données neuronales en texte avec augmentation de texte basée sur la LM', 'pt': 'Geração de dados neurais para texto com aumento de texto baseado em LM', 'ar': 'توليد البيانات العصبية إلى نص مع زيادة النص المستندة إلى LM', 'zh': '因 LM 增成神经数至文本', 'ru': 'Генерация нейронных данных в текст с LM-основанным расширением текста', 'ja': 'LMベースのテキスト拡張によるニューラルデータツーテキスト生成', 'ga': 'Giniúint Néarach Sonraí go Téacs le Méadú Téacs atá bunaithe ar LM', 'hi': 'LM-आधारित पाठ संवर्धन के साथ तंत्रिका डेटा-टू-टेक्स्ट जनरेशन', 'hu': 'Neurális adat-szöveg generálás LM-alapú szövegbővítéssel', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Δημιουργία νευρωνικών δεδομένων σε κείμενο με ενίσχυση κειμένου βασισμένη σε LM', 'it': 'Generazione dati-testo neurale con aumento del testo basato su LM', 'lt': 'Neuralinių duomenų į tekstą generavimas su LM pagrįstu teksto augmentavimu', 'kk': 'Name', 'mk': 'Генерација на неурални податоци во текст со текстова агментација базирана на LM', 'ml': 'Name', 'ms': 'Jenerasi Data-ke-Teks Neural dengan Pengesahan Teks Berasas LM', 'mt': 'Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Dejta għal Test Newrali b’Aġġustament tat-Test ibbażat fuq LM', 'mn': 'LM-д суурилсан Текст нэмэгдүүлэлт', 'pl': 'Generowanie neuronowych danych do tekstu z rozszerzeniem tekstu opartym na LM', 'no': 'Generering av nøyrale data- til- tekst med LM- basert tekstaugmentasjon', 'ro': 'Generarea neurală de date în text cu augmentarea textului bazată pe LM', 'sr': 'Neuralna generacija podataka na tekst sa povećanjem teksta na LM-u', 'so': 'Generation of macluumaad-to-text with LM-based Augmentation text', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Generation av neural data till text med LM-baserad textförstärkning', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'vi': 'Kết cấu dữ liệu qua văn bản thần kinh bằng khuếch đại văn bản LM', 'uz': 'Name', 'da': 'Generation af neural data til tekst med LM-baseret tekstforøgelse', 'de': 'Neurale Daten-zu-Text-Generierung mit LM-basierter Text-Augmentation', 'bg': 'Генериране на невронни данни към текст с LM- базирано увеличаване на текста', 'nl': 'Neurale data-to-text generatie met LM-gebaseerde tekstvergroting', 'hr': 'Neuralna generacija podataka na tekst s povećanjem teksta na LM-u', 'id': 'Generasi Data-ke-Teks Neural dengan Augmentasi Teks berdasarkan LM', 'sw': 'Utengenezaji wa Matandao ya Data-To-Text with Augmentation Text based LM', 'fa': 'تولید داده\u200cهای عصبی به متن با افزایش متن بنیاد LM', 'tr': 'LM tabanly Metin Agymlandyrmasy bilen näyral Maglumaty Metin Döredişi', 'ko': 'LM 기반 텍스트 강화 신경 데이터에서 텍스트 생성', 'am': 'የኩነቶች መረጃ', 'hy': 'Comment', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i të dhënave në tekst neuronal me rritje teksti me bazë në LM', 'af': 'Name', 'az': 'LM tabanlı Metin Uğultması ilə Nöral Data-to-Text Generation', 'bs': 'Neuralna generacija podataka na tekst sa povećanjem teksta na LM-u', 'bn': 'LM-ভিত্তিক টেক্সট অ্যাগমেন্টেশন সহ নিউরেল ডাটা থেকে টেক্সট জেনারেশন', 'et': 'Närviandmete loomine tekstiks LM-põhise teksti suurendamisega', 'cs': 'Generování neurálních dat na text s LM rozšířením textu', 'ca': 'Generació neuronal de dades a text amb augmentació de text basada en LM', 'fi': 'Neuraalinen data-to-text generointi LM-pohjaisella tekstilisäyksellä', 'he': 'יצירת מידע נוירולי לטקסט עם גידול טקסט מבוסס על LM', 'jv': 'Generation', 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje nevronskih podatkov v besedilo s povečanjem besedila na osnovi LM', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'LM-based་ཡི་གེ་བཅར་སྦྱོར་ཡོད་པའི་སྒུལ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ལ་ཡིག་ཆ་སྐྱེལ་བ'}
{'en': 'For many new application domains for data-to-text generation, the main obstacle in training neural models consists of a lack of training data. While usually large numbers of instances are available on the data side, often only very few text samples are available. To address this problem, we here propose a novel few-shot approach for this setting. Our approach automatically augments the data available for training by (i) generating new text samples based on replacing specific values by alternative ones from the same category, (ii) generating new text samples based on GPT-2, and (iii) proposing an automatic method for pairing the new text samples with data samples. As the text augmentation can introduce noise to the training data, we use cycle consistency as an objective, in order to make sure that a given data sample can be correctly reconstructed after having been formulated as text (and that text samples can be reconstructed from data). On both the E2E and WebNLG benchmarks, we show that this weakly supervised training paradigm is able to outperform fully supervised sequence-to-sequence models with less than 10 % of the training set. By utilizing all annotated data, our model can boost the performance of a standard sequence-to-sequence model by over 5 BLEU points, establishing a new state-of-the-art on both datasets.', 'fr': "Pour de nombreux nouveaux domaines d'application pour la génération de données en texte, le principal obstacle à l'entraînement des modèles neuronaux est le manque de données d'entraînement. Alors qu'un grand nombre d'instances sont généralement disponibles côté données, très peu d'exemples de texte sont souvent disponibles. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous proposons ici une nouvelle approche en quelques coups pour ce contexte. Notre approche augmente automatiquement les données disponibles pour la formation en (i) générant de nouveaux échantillons de texte basés sur le remplacement de valeurs spécifiques par des valeurs alternatives de la même catégorie, (ii) générant de nouveaux échantillons de texte basés sur GPT-2, et (iii) proposant une méthode automatique pour apparier les nouveaux échantillons de texte avec des données échantillons. Comme l'augmentation de texte peut introduire du bruit dans les données d'entraînement, nous utilisons la cohérence du cycle comme objectif, afin de nous assurer qu'un échantillon de données donné peut être correctement reconstruit après avoir été formulé sous forme de texte (et que les échantillons de texte peuvent être reconstruits à partir des données). Sur les benchmarks E2E et WebNLG, nous montrons que ce paradigme d'entraînement faiblement supervisé est capable de surpasser les modèles séquence à séquence entièrement supervisés avec moins de 10\xa0% de l'ensemble d'entraînement. En utilisant toutes les données annotées, notre modèle peut améliorer les performances d'un modèle séquence-séquence standard de plus de 5 points BLEU, établissant ainsi une nouvelle technologie de pointe sur les deux ensembles de données.", 'ar': 'بالنسبة للعديد من مجالات التطبيق الجديدة لتوليد البيانات إلى نص ، تتمثل العقبة الرئيسية في تدريب النماذج العصبية في نقص بيانات التدريب. على الرغم من توفر عدد كبير من المثيلات على جانب البيانات ، لا يتوفر سوى عدد قليل جدًا من العينات النصية. لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، نقترح هنا نهجًا جديدًا قليل اللقطات لهذا الإعداد. يعمل نهجنا تلقائيًا على زيادة البيانات المتاحة للتدريب عن طريق (1) إنشاء عينات نصية جديدة بناءً على استبدال قيم محددة بقيم بديلة من نفس الفئة ، (2) إنشاء عينات نصية جديدة بناءً على GPT-2 ، و (3) اقتراح نموذج تلقائي طريقة لإقران عينات النص الجديدة مع عينات البيانات. نظرًا لأن زيادة النص يمكن أن تحدث ضوضاء لبيانات التدريب ، فإننا نستخدم تناسق الدورة كهدف ، من أجل التأكد من إمكانية إعادة بناء عينة بيانات معينة بشكل صحيح بعد صياغتها كنص (ويمكن إعادة بناء عينات النص من البيانات ). في كل من معايير E2E و WebNLG ، نظهر أن نموذج التدريب الخاضع للإشراف الضعيف هذا قادر على التفوق في الأداء على نماذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل الخاضعة للإشراف الكامل بأقل من 10٪ من مجموعة التدريب. من خلال استخدام جميع البيانات المشروحة ، يمكن لنموذجنا تعزيز أداء نموذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل القياسي بأكثر من 5 نقاط BLEU ، مما يؤدي إلى إنشاء حالة جديدة من الفن في مجموعتي البيانات.', 'es': 'Para muchos dominios de aplicación nuevos para la generación de datos a texto, el principal obstáculo en el entrenamiento de modelos neuronales consiste en la falta de datos de entrenamiento. Si bien normalmente hay un gran número de instancias disponibles en el lado de los datos, a menudo solo hay muy pocas muestras de texto disponibles. Para abordar este problema, proponemos aquí un enfoque novedoso de pocos disparos para este entorno. Nuestro enfoque aumenta automáticamente los datos disponibles para el entrenamiento al (i) generar nuevas muestras de texto basadas en la sustitución de valores específicos por otros alternativos de la misma categoría, (ii) generar nuevas muestras de texto basadas en GPT-2 y (iii) proponer un método automático para emparejar las nuevas muestras de texto con datos muestras. Como el aumento de texto puede introducir ruido en los datos de entrenamiento, utilizamos la coherencia del ciclo como objetivo, para asegurarnos de que una muestra de datos dada se pueda reconstruir correctamente después de haber sido formulada como texto (y que las muestras de texto se puedan reconstruir a partir de los datos). En los puntos de referencia E2E y WebNLG, mostramos que este paradigma de entrenamiento débilmente supervisado es capaz de superar a los modelos de secuencia a secuencia totalmente supervisados con menos del 10% del conjunto de entrenamiento. Al utilizar todos los datos anotados, nuestro modelo puede aumentar el rendimiento de un modelo estándar de secuencia a secuencia en más de 5 puntos BLEU, lo que establece un nuevo estado de vanguardia en ambos conjuntos de datos.', 'pt': 'Para muitos novos domínios de aplicação para geração de dados para texto, o principal obstáculo no treinamento de modelos neurais consiste na falta de dados de treinamento. Embora geralmente um grande número de instâncias esteja disponível no lado dos dados, muitas vezes apenas poucas amostras de texto estão disponíveis. Para resolver esse problema, propomos aqui uma nova abordagem de poucos tiros para essa configuração. Nossa abordagem aumenta automaticamente os dados disponíveis para treinamento (i) gerando novas amostras de texto com base na substituição de valores específicos por valores alternativos da mesma categoria, (ii) gerando novas amostras de texto com base no GPT-2 e (iii) propondo uma método para emparelhar as novas amostras de texto com amostras de dados. Como o aumento de texto pode introduzir ruído nos dados de treinamento, usamos a consistência de ciclo como objetivo, a fim de garantir que uma determinada amostra de dados possa ser reconstruída corretamente após ter sido formulada como texto (e que amostras de texto possam ser reconstruídas a partir de dados ). Nos benchmarks E2E e WebNLG, mostramos que esse paradigma de treinamento fracamente supervisionado é capaz de superar os modelos de sequência a sequência totalmente supervisionados com menos de 10% do conjunto de treinamento. Ao utilizar todos os dados anotados, nosso modelo pode aumentar o desempenho de um modelo de sequência a sequência padrão em mais de 5 pontos BLEU, estabelecendo um novo estado da arte em ambos os conjuntos de dados.', 'ja': 'データからテキストへの生成のための多くの新しいアプリケーションドメインについて、ニューラルモデルのトレーニングにおける主な障害は、トレーニングデータの欠如である。 通常、多数のインスタンスがデータ側で利用可能ですが、テキストサンプルはごくわずかです。 この問題に対処するために、ここではこの設定のための斬新な数ショットアプローチを提案します。 当社のアプローチは、(i)特定の値を同じカテゴリの代替値に置き換えることに基づいて新しいテキストサンプルを生成すること、(ii) GPT -2に基づいて新しいテキストサンプルを生成すること、および(iii)新しいテキストサンプルをデータサンプルとペアリングするための自動方法を提案することによって、トレーニングに利用可能なデータを自動的に増強します。 テキスト増強は、トレーニングデータにノイズを導入することができるため、テキストとして定式化された後に与えられたデータサンプルが正しく再構築されるように（そしてテキストサンプルがデータから再構築されるように）、サイクル一貫性を目的として使用します。 E 2 EベンチマークとWebNLGベンチマークの両方で、この弱い監督下のトレーニングパラダイムは、トレーニングセットの10 ％未満で完全に監督されたシーケンスツーシーケンスモデルを上回ることができることを示しています。 すべての注釈付きデータを利用することで、当社のモデルは、標準的なシーケンスツーシーケンスモデルのパフォーマンスを5ポイント以上向上させ、両方のデータセットで最新のパフォーマンスを確立することができます。', 'zh': '凡诸文本新应用领域,神经模形之要,阙于训练。 虽数端常有大实可用,然常有少文本样本可用。 为此设新少镜头法于此。 吾法以下自广可用之数:(i)以同类易特定值来生新样本,(ii)GPT-2生新样本,及(iii)发一样本样本与数样本配对自行之法。 文本增强,可以噪声入训练数据,故用循环一致性为的,以保给定之数样本表为文本后可以正重建(而文本样本可以从数中重建)。 E2E 、 WebNLG 准试,明此弱监范胜集不 10% 者全监序之。 因诸带注之数,可以序其5 BLEU,而于两数集上立最先进之术。', 'hi': 'डेटा-टू-टेक्स्ट पीढ़ी के लिए कई नए एप्लिकेशन डोमेन के लिए, प्रशिक्षण तंत्रिका मॉडल में मुख्य बाधा में प्रशिक्षण डेटा की कमी होती है। जबकि आमतौर पर बड़ी संख्या में उदाहरण डेटा पक्ष पर उपलब्ध होते हैं, अक्सर केवल बहुत कम पाठ नमूने उपलब्ध होते हैं। इस समस्या को हल करने के लिए, हम यहां इस सेटिंग के लिए एक उपन्यास कुछ-शॉट दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारा दृष्टिकोण स्वचालित रूप से प्रशिक्षण के लिए उपलब्ध डेटा को बढ़ाता है (i) एक ही श्रेणी के वैकल्पिक लोगों द्वारा विशिष्ट मानों को प्रतिस्थापित करने के आधार पर नए पाठ नमूने उत्पन्न करना, (ii) जीपीटी -2 के आधार पर नए पाठ नमूने उत्पन्न करना, और (iii) डेटा नमूनों के साथ नए पाठ नमूनों को जोड़ने के लिए एक स्वचालित विधि का प्रस्ताव करना। जैसा कि पाठ वृद्धि प्रशिक्षण डेटा के लिए शोर पेश कर सकती है, हम एक उद्देश्य के रूप में चक्र स्थिरता का उपयोग करते हैं, यह सुनिश्चित करने के लिए कि किसी दिए गए डेटा नमूने को पाठ के रूप में तैयार किए जाने के बाद सही ढंग से पुनर्निर्मित किया जा सकता है (और पाठ के नमूनों को डेटा से पुनर्निर्मित किया जा सकता है)। E2E और WebNLG बेंचमार्क दोनों पर, हम दिखाते हैं कि यह कमजोर रूप से पर्यवेक्षित प्रशिक्षण प्रतिमान प्रशिक्षण सेट के 10% से कम के साथ पूरी तरह से पर्यवेक्षित अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल को मात देने में सक्षम है। सभी एनोटेट किए गए डेटा का उपयोग करके, हमारा मॉडल 5 BLEU बिंदुओं से अधिक एक मानक अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल के प्रदर्शन को बढ़ावा दे सकता है, दोनों डेटासेट पर एक नया अत्याधुनिक स्थापित कर सकता है।', 'ru': 'Для многих новых областей применения для генерации данных в текст основным препятствием в обучении нейронных моделей является отсутствие обучающих данных. Хотя, как правило, имеется большое количество экземпляров на стороне данных, часто доступно очень мало образцов текста. Чтобы решить эту проблему, мы здесь предлагаем новый подход с несколькими выстрелами для этой установки. Наш подход автоматически дополняет данные, доступные для обучения, путем (i) создания новых образцов текста на основе замены конкретных значений альтернативными значениями из той же категории, (ii) создания новых образцов текста на основе GPT-2 и (iii) предложения автоматического метода сопряжения новых образцов текста с образцами данных. Поскольку увеличение текста может создавать шум в обучающих данных, мы используем последовательность цикла в качестве цели, чтобы убедиться, что данная выборка данных может быть правильно реконструирована после того, как она была сформулирована в виде текста (и что образцы текста могут быть реконструированы из данных). На обоих эталонах E2E и WebNLG мы показываем, что эта слабо контролируемая парадигма обучения способна превзойти полностью контролируемые модели последовательности с менее чем 10% обучающего набора. Используя все аннотированные данные, наша модель может повысить производительность стандартной модели последовательности более чем на 5 точек BLEU, создавая новое современное состояние на обоих наборах данных.', 'ga': 'I gcás go leor réimsí feidhmchlár nua do ghiniúint sonraí go téacs, is é an príomh-chonstaic in oiliúint samhlacha néaracha ná easpa sonraí oiliúna. Cé gur gnách go mbíonn líon mór cásanna ar fáil ar thaobh na sonraí, is minic nach mbíonn ach fíorbheagán samplaí téacs ar fáil. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an bhfadhb seo, molaimid anseo cur chuige nua cúpla seat don socrú seo. Méadaíonn ár gcur chuige na sonraí atá ar fáil le haghaidh oiliúna go huathoibríoch trí (i) samplaí téacs nua a ghiniúint bunaithe ar luachanna sonracha a chur in ionad luachanna sonracha ón gcatagóir chéanna, (ii) samplaí téacs nua a ghiniúint bunaithe ar GPT-2, agus (iii) sampla uathoibríoch a mholadh. modh chun na samplaí téacs nua a phéireáil le samplaí sonraí. Toisc gur féidir leis an méadú téacs torann a thabhairt isteach sna sonraí oiliúna, bainimid úsáid as comhsheasmhacht timthrialla mar chuspóir, chun a chinntiú gur féidir sampla sonraí tugtha a athchruthú i gceart tar éis é a fhoirmliú mar théacs (agus gur féidir samplaí téacs a athchruthú ó shonraí ). Ar thagarmharcanna E2E agus WebNLG araon, léirímid go bhfuil an paraidím oiliúna seo faoi mhaoirsiú lag in ann sárobair a dhéanamh ar mhúnlaí seicheamh-go-seicheamh atá faoi mhaoirseacht iomlán le níos lú ná 10% den fhoireann oiliúna. Trí úsáid a bhaint as na sonraí go léir anótáilte, is féidir lenár múnla feidhmíocht samhail chaighdeánach seicheamh-go-seicheamh a mhéadú faoi níos mó ná 5 phointe BLEU, ag bunú nua-aimseartha ar an dá thacar sonraí.', 'el': 'Για πολλούς νέους τομείς εφαρμογής για τη δημιουργία δεδομένων-σε-κείμενο, το κύριο εμπόδιο στην εκπαίδευση νευρωνικών μοντέλων συνίσταται στην έλλειψη δεδομένων κατάρτισης. Ενώ συνήθως είναι διαθέσιμοι μεγάλος αριθμός περιπτώσεων από την πλευρά των δεδομένων, συχνά είναι διαθέσιμα μόνο πολύ λίγα δείγματα κειμένου. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το πρόβλημα, προτείνουμε εδώ μια νέα προσέγγιση λίγων πυροβολισμών για αυτό το περιβάλλον. Η προσέγγισή μας επεκτείνει αυτόματα τα δεδομένα που είναι διαθέσιμα για εκπαίδευση δημιουργώντας νέα δείγματα κειμένου με βάση την αντικατάσταση συγκεκριμένων τιμών από εναλλακτικές τιμές από την ίδια κατηγορία, (ii) δημιουργία νέων δειγμάτων κειμένου με βάση το και (iii) πρόταση αυτόματης μεθόδου για τη σύζευξη των νέων δειγμάτων κειμένου με δείγματα δεδομένων. Δεδομένου ότι η αύξηση κειμένου μπορεί να εισαγάγει θόρυβο στα δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης, χρησιμοποιούμε ως στόχο τη συνοχή κύκλου, προκειμένου να διασφαλίσουμε ότι ένα δεδομένο δείγμα δεδομένων μπορεί να ανακατασκευαστεί σωστά αφού διατυπωθεί ως κείμενο (και ότι τα δείγματα κειμένου μπορούν να αναπαραχθούν από δεδομένα). Τόσο στα σημεία αναφοράς E2E όσο και στο Δείχνουμε ότι αυτό το ανεπαρκώς εποπτευόμενο πρότυπο εκπαίδευσης είναι σε θέση να ξεπεράσει πλήρως εποπτευόμενα μοντέλα ακολουθίας-ακολουθίας με λιγότερο από 10% του συνόλου εκπαίδευσης. Χρησιμοποιώντας όλα τα σχολιασμένα δεδομένα, το μοντέλο μας μπορεί να ενισχύσει την απόδοση ενός τυποποιημένου μοντέλου ακολουθίας-ακολουθίας με πάνω από πέντε σημεία καθιερώνοντας μια νέα κατάσταση τεχνολογίας και στα δύο σύνολα δεδομένων.', 'hu': 'Számos új alkalmazási terület esetében a neurális modellek képzésének fő akadálya az edzési adatok hiánya. Bár általában nagy számú példány áll rendelkezésre az adatok oldalán, gyakran csak nagyon kevés szövegminta áll rendelkezésre. Ennek a problémának a megoldására itt egy új, néhány lövéses megközelítést javasolunk erre a környezetre. Megközelítésünk automatikusan bővíti a képzésre rendelkezésre álló adatokat: (i) új szövegminták generálásával az adott kategóriába tartozó alternatív értékek helyettesítése alapján, (ii) új szövegminták generálásával GPT-2 alapján, és (iii) automatikus módszert javasol az új szövegminták és adatminták párosítására. Mivel a szövegbővítés zajt vezethet be az edzési adatokba, célkitűzésként a cikluskövetkezetességet használjuk annak érdekében, hogy egy adott adatmintát helyesen rekonstruálhassuk szövegként (és hogy a szövegmintákat adatokból rekonstruálhatjuk). Mind az E2E, mind a WebNLG referenciaértékeken megmutatjuk, hogy ez a gyengén felügyelt képzési paradigma képes teljes mértékben felügyelt szekvencia-szekvencia modelleket felülmúlni, kevesebb mint 10%-ával az edzéskészlet. Az összes jegyzetelt adat felhasználásával modellünk több mint 5 BLEU ponttal növelheti a standard szekvencia-szekvencia modell teljesítményét, így mindkét adatkészleten új korszerűséget teremt.', 'it': "Per molti nuovi domini applicativi per la generazione data-to-text, l'ostacolo principale nella formazione dei modelli neurali consiste nella mancanza di dati di allenamento. Mentre di solito sono disponibili un gran numero di istanze sul lato dei dati, spesso sono disponibili solo pochissimi esempi di testo. Per affrontare questo problema, proponiamo qui un nuovo approccio a poche riprese per questo ambiente. Il nostro approccio aumenta automaticamente i dati disponibili per la formazione (i) generando nuovi campioni di testo basati sulla sostituzione di valori specifici con quelli alternativi della stessa categoria, (ii) generando nuovi campioni di testo basati su GPT-2 e (iii) proponendo un metodo automatico per l'abbinamento dei nuovi campioni di testo con campioni di dati. Poiché l'aumento del testo può introdurre rumore nei dati di allenamento, utilizziamo come obiettivo la coerenza del ciclo, al fine di garantire che un dato campione di dati possa essere correttamente ricostruito dopo essere stato formulato come testo (e che i campioni di testo possano essere ricostruiti dai dati). Sia sui benchmark E2E che WebNLG, mostriamo che questo paradigma di allenamento debolmente supervisionato è in grado di superare i modelli sequenza-sequenza completamente supervisionati con meno del 10% del set di allenamento. Utilizzando tutti i dati annotati, il nostro modello può aumentare le prestazioni di un modello sequenza-sequenza standard di oltre 5 punti BLEU, stabilendo un nuovo stato dell'arte su entrambi i set di dati.", 'ka': 'ბევრი ახალი პროგრამების დიომენებისთვის მონაცემებისთვის მონაცემებისთვის, მნიშვნელოვანი ნეიროლური მოდელების განაკეთებაში შეუძლებელია განაკეთება მონაცე მაგრამ საშუალოდ დიდი ინსტაციების რაოდენობა მონაცემების მხარეს ხელსახულია, მხოლოდ მხოლოდ მცირე ტექსტის ჩანაწერები ხელსახულია ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტისთვის, ჩვენ აქ პრობლემა რამდენიმე სტრიქტის მიღება. ჩვენი მოწყობილობა ავტომატურად ახალი ტექსტის ჩანაწერებისთვის მონაცემების შექმნა i) ახალი ტექსტის ჩანაწერებისთვის, რომელიც განსაცემებული მნიშვნელობების შეცვლაზე იგივე კატეგორიდან, ii) ახალი ტექსტის ჩანაწერების შექმნა GPT- როგორც ტექსტის აგეგენტაცია შეუძლია კუნძულებას განაკეთებული მონაცემებისთვის ჩვენ გამოყენებთ სიკონსტექტის კონსტექტირება, როგორც მინდა დარწმუნოთ, რომ მონაცემების მონაცემები შეიძლია მსგავსი E2E და WebNLG ბენქმარკებით ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ეს უბრალოდ დანარწმუნებული განსწავლების პარადიგმა შეუძლია უფრო დანარწმუნებული მოდელების შესაძლებლობა, რომლებიც განსწავლების 10% უფრო ნაკ ჩვენი მოდელი შეიძლება გამოიყენოთ ყველა ანოტირებული მონაცემები, რომელიც ჩვენი მოდელი უფრო მეტი ბლესო პირველზე მეტი მოდელის მონაცემების გამოყენებას, რომელიც ორივე მონაცემების განმა', 'lt': 'Daugeliui naujų duomenų ir tekstų kūrimo taikymo sričių pagrindinė neuromodelių mokymo kliūtis yra mokymo duomenų trūkumas. Nors duomenų pusėje paprastai yra daug atvejų, dažnai yra tik labai nedaug tekstinių mėginių. Siekiant išspręsti šią problem ą, mes čia siūlome naują kelių nuotraukų požiūrį į šią aplinkybę. Mūsų metodas automatiškai padidina mokymui prieinamus duomenis: i) sukuriant naujus teksto mėginius, kurių pagrindu konkrečios vertės pakeičiamos tos pačios kategorijos alternatyviomis vertėmis; ii) sukuriant naujus teksto mėginius, pagrįstus GPT-2, ir iii) siūlant automatinį naujų teksto mėginių ir duomenų mėginių parinimo metodą. Kadangi teksto didinimas gali sukelti triukšmą mokymo duomenims, kaip tikslą mes naudojame ciklo nuoseklumą, siekiant užtikrinti, kad tam tikras duomenų mėginys būtų tinkamai atstatytas po to, kai jis buvo suformuluotas kaip tekstas (ir kad teksto mėginiai būtų atstatyti iš duomenų). Atsižvelgdami į E2E ir WebNLG lyginamuosius rodiklius, parodome, kad šis silpnai prižiūrimas mokymo paradigmas gali būti didesnis už visiškai prižiūrimus iš eilės į eilę modelius su mažiau kaip 10 % mokymo rinkinio. Naudodami visus anotuotus duomenis, mūsų modelis gali padidinti standartinio sekos modelio veiksmingumą daugiau kaip 5 BLEU taškais, nustatydamas naujausią pažangą abiejuose duomenų rinkiniuose.', 'kk': 'Деректерден мәтін құру үшін көптеген жаңа қолданбалардың домендері үшін невралдық моделдерді оқыту үшін негізгі бәлкім - оқыту деректері жоқ. Кәдімгі деректер жағында үлкен нәтижелер бар болса, көбінде тек бірнеше мәтін үлгілері бар. Бұл мәселеге шешу үшін, осы параметр үшін романдың бірнеше шарттарының қасиетін ұсынамыз. Біздің тәсіліміміз бір санаттағы арнаулы мәндерді ауыстыруға негізделген жаңа мәтін үлгілерін автоматты түрде өзгертеді, i i) GPT- 2 негіздеген жаңа мәтін үлгілерін жасап, iii) жаңа мәтін үлгілерін деректер үлгілерімен біріктіру үші Мәтін көтерілімі оқыту деректеріне дыбыс бере алатында, мәтін ретінде (мәтін үлгілері деректерден қайта құрылады) дегенді тексеру үшін мәтін үлгілерін қайта құруға болады. E2E және WebNLG бағдарламалардың екеуінде бұл бағдарламалы бақылау парадигмі 10% деген бақылау бағдарламаларының толық бақылау үлгілерін өзгертуге болады. Бүкіл белгіленген деректерді қолдану арқылы, біздің үлгіміз екі деректер қорларында жаңа жағдайды бағдарламалық күйіне жеткізу үшін стандартты реттеу үлгісін 5 BLEU нүктелерінен артық көмектесе алады.', 'ms': 'Untuk banyak domain aplikasi baru untuk generasi data-ke-teks, halangan utama dalam latihan model saraf terdiri daripada kekurangan data latihan. Walaupun biasanya nombor besar kes tersedia di sisi data, biasanya hanya sedikit sampel teks tersedia. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami di sini mengusulkan pendekatan baru beberapa tembakan untuk tetapan ini. pendekatan kita secara automatik meningkatkan data yang tersedia untuk latihan dengan (i) menghasilkan sampel teks baru berdasarkan menggantikan nilai spesifik dengan nilai alternatif dari kategori yang sama, (ii) menghasilkan sampel teks baru berdasarkan GPT-2, dan (iii) melaporkan kaedah automatik untuk pasang sampel teks baru dengan sampel data. Sebagaimana peningkatan teks boleh memperkenalkan bunyi kepada data latihan, kita gunakan kesistensi siklus sebagai objektif, untuk memastikan bahawa sampel data yang diberikan boleh dibangun semula dengan betul selepas telah dibentuk sebagai teks (dan sampel teks boleh dibangun semula dari data). Pada kedua-dua tanda referensi E2E dan WebNLG, kita menunjukkan bahawa paradigma latihan yang mengawasi lemah ini mampu melebihi model urutan-urutan yang diawasi sepenuhnya dengan kurang dari 10% set latihan. Dengan menggunakan semua data yang dicatat, model kita boleh meningkatkan prestasi model rangkaian-ke-rangkaian piawai dengan lebih dari 5 titik BLEU, menetapkan keadaan baru pada kedua-dua set data.', 'mk': 'For many new application domains for data-to-text generation, the main obstacle in training neural models consists of a lack of training data.  Иако обично голем број инциденти се достапни на страната на податоците, честопати се достапни само многу малку текстови примероци. За да го решиме овој проблем, ние овде предложуваме нов пристап со неколку снимки за ова поставување. Нашиот пристап автоматски ги зголемува податоците достапни за обука со (i) генерирање нови текстови примероци базирани на замената на специфичните вредности со алтернативни вредности од истата категорија, (ii) генерирање нови текстови примероци базирани на GPT-2 и (iii) предложување автоматски метод за пар Бидејќи зголемувањето на текстот може да воведе бучава во податоците за обука, ние ја користиме константноста на циклусот како цел, со цел да се осигури дека дадениот примерок на податоци може да биде правилно реконструиран откако е формулиран како текст (и дека примероците на текст може да бидат реконструирани од под Во однос на E2E и WebNLG, покажуваме дека овој слабо надгледуван парадигм на обука може да ги надмине целосно надгледуваните модели од секвенца до секвенца со помалку од 10 отсто од обуката. Со искористување на сите анотирани податоци, нашиот модел може да ја зголеми перформансата на стандардниот модел од секвенца до секвенца за повеќе од 5 БЛЕ точки, воспоставувајќи нова најнова состојба на двете податоци.', 'mt': 'Għal ħafna oqsma ġodda ta’ applikazzjoni għall-ġenerazzjoni tad-dejta fit-test, l-ostaklu ewlieni fit-taħriġ tal-mudelli newrali jikkonsisti f’nuqqas ta’ dejta ta’ taħriġ. Filwaqt li normalment numru kbir ta’ każijiet huma disponibbli fuq in-naħa tad-dejta, ħafna drabi ftit biss kampjuni tat-test huma disponibbli. Biex nindirizzaw din il-problem a, hawnhekk qed nipproponu approċċ ġdid bi ftit skopijiet għal dan l-ambjent. L-approċċ tagħna awtomatikament i żid id-dejta disponibbli għat-taħriġ billi (i) jiġġenera kampjuni ġodda tat-test ibbażati fuq is-sostituzzjoni ta’ valuri speċifiċi b’valuri alternattivi mill-istess kategorija, (ii) jiġġenera kampjuni ġodda tat-test ibbażati fuq il-GPT-2, u (iii) jipproponi metodu awtomatiku għall-paragun tal-kampjuni ġodda tat-test mal-kampjuni tad-dejta. Peress li ż-żieda fit-test tista’ tintroduċi l-istorbju fid-dejta tat-taħriġ, a ħna nużaw il-konsistenza taċ-ċiklu bħala għan, sabiex niżguraw li kampjun ta’ dejta partikolari jista’ jiġi rikostrutt b’mod korrett wara li jkun ġie fformulat bħala test (u li kampjuni tat-test jistgħu jiġu rikostrutti mid-dejta). Fir-rigward kemm tal-parametri referenzjarji E2E kif ukoll tal-WebNLG, nagħmlu evidenza li dan il-paradigma ta’ taħriġ b’superviżjoni dgħajfa tista’ taqbeż il-mudelli ta’ sekwenza għal sekwenza b’inqas minn 10% tas-sett ta’ taħriġ issorveljat bis-sħiħ. Permezz tal-użu tad-dejta annotata kollha, il-mudell tagħna jista’ jsaħħa ħ il-prestazzjoni ta’ mudell standard minn sekwenza għal sekwenza b’aktar minn 5 punti BLEU, li jistabbilixxi l-aħħar avvanz ġdid fuq iż-żewġ settijiet tad-dejta.', 'ml': 'ഡേറ്റാ ടെക്സ്റ്റ് തലമുറയ്ക്കുവേണ്ടി പല പുതിയ പ്രയോഗങ്ങളുടെ ഡോമെനുകള്\u200dക്കും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട തടസ്സങ്ങള്\u200d നെയൂ സാധാരണ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ഭാഗത്ത് വലിയ സംഖ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാകുമ്പോള്\u200d, എപ്പോഴും വളരെ കുറച്ചു ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ടാമ്പുകള്\u200d ലഭ ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d, ഈ സജ്ജീകരണത്തിന് നമ്മളിവിടെ ഒരു നോവല്\u200d വെടിയുടെ അടുത നമ്മുടെ സമ്പാദ്യം സ്വയം പരിശീലനത്തിന് ലഭ്യമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു (i) ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പുതിയ വില മാമ്പുകള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു; (ii) ജിപിടി- 2 അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള പുതിയ വാചക ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ആഗ്രഹിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ട്രെയിനിങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ശബ്ദമുണ്ടാക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു ലക്ഷ്യത്തിനായി നമ്മള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. കൊടുത്ത ഡേറ്റാ ട ഈ പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ പത്ത് ശതമാന പരിശീലന പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി നിരീക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്നുണ് എല്ലാ വിവരങ്ങളും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d 5 ബിലിയൂ പോയിന്\u200dറുകള്\u200dക്ക് മുകളില്\u200d സാധാരണ സെക്കന്\u200dസ്- ട്രോക്സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മോഡലിന്\u200dറെ പ്രകടനം പ്', 'mn': 'Мэдээлэл болон текст үеийн олон шинэ хэрэглээний тулд сэтгэл хөдлөлийн загваруудын гол бэрхшээл нь сургалт өгөгдлийн алдаагүй байдаг. Хэдийгээр ихэвчлэн маш олон тохиолдол өгөгдлийн талд байдаг ч, ихэвчлэн хэд хэдэн текст жишээ л байдаг. Энэ асуудлыг бодохын тулд бид энд хэдэн шинэ арга барилга тавьдаг. Бидний арга хэлбэрээс автоматаар суралцах боломжтой өгөгдлийг (i) шинэ текст жишээг үүсгэдэг. Яг ижил хэлбэрээс тодорхой утгыг орлуулж, ii) GPT-2 дээр суурилсан шинэ текст жишээг үүсгэдэг, мөн iii) шинэ текст жишээг өгөгдлийн жишээлбэрээр хо Текст нэмэгдүүлэх нь сургалтын өгөгдлийн мэдээллээр чимээгүй байдлыг тайлбарлаж чадна. Бид циклийн тогтвортой байдлыг зорилготой болгон ашиглаж, өгөгдлийн шалгалтыг текст гэж тодорхойлогдсон дараа зөв дахин бүтээж чадна. E2E болон WebNLG тооны хоёр талаар бид энэ сул хязгаарлагдсан сургалтын парадигм нь сургалтын 10% бага хувь нь бүрэн удирдлагатай дарааллын загварыг хийж чадна. Бүх нотлогдсон өгөгдлийг ашигласнаар бидний загвар нь стандарт дарааллын дарааллын загварын үйлдвэрлэлийг 5 BLEU цэгээр нэмэгдүүлж, өгөгдлийн сангийн хоёр дахь шинэ урлагийн байдал байгуулах боломжтой.', 'no': 'For mange nye programdomene for data- til- tekstgenerering, er det viktigste hindringane i utlæring av neuralmodeller innebygd av ein mangling av opplæringsdata. Mens ofte mange instansar er tilgjengelege på datasiden, er ofte bare mange tekstprøver tilgjengelege. For å setja opp dette problemet, fører vi ei novel få fototilnærming for denne innstillinga. Tilnærminga vårt automatisk aukar data tilgjengelege for trening av i) lager nye tekstprøver basert på å erstatta spesifikke verdiar med alternativ verdiar frå same kategori, ii) lager nye tekstprøver basert på GPT-2, og iii) foreslår ein automatisk metode for å pare nye tekstprøver med dataprøver. Som tekstaugmentasjonen kan introdusera støy til opplæringsdata, bruker vi sykluskonstitusjonen som mål for å sikre på at eit dataprøve kan gjenopprettastast rett etter at det er formert som tekst (og at tekstprøva kan gjenopprettastast frå data). På både E2E og WebNLG-benchmarkene viser vi at denne vekke oversikte treningsparadigmen kan utføre fullstendig oversikte sekvens-til-sekvensmodeller med mindre enn 10 % av opplæringssettet. Ved å bruka alle merkte data, kan modellen vårt styra utviklinga av ein standard sekvens-til-sekvensmodell med over 5 BLEU-punkt, og oppretta ein ny kunsttilstand på begge datasett.', 'pl': 'W przypadku wielu nowych domen zastosowań generowania danych-tekstowych główną przeszkodą w treningu modeli neuronowych jest brak danych treningowych. Chociaż zwykle duża liczba instancji jest dostępnych po stronie danych, często dostępnych jest tylko bardzo mało próbek tekstowych. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, proponujemy tutaj nowe podejście kilku strzałów do tego otoczenia. Nasze podejście automatycznie powiększa dane dostępne do szkolenia poprzez (i) generowanie nowych próbek tekstowych opartych na zastąpieniu określonych wartości alternatywnymi z tej samej kategorii, (ii) generowanie nowych próbek tekstowych opartych na GPT-2 oraz (iii) zaproponowanie automatycznej metody parowania nowych próbek tekstowych z próbkami danych. Ponieważ powiększenie tekstu może wprowadzić hałas do danych treningowych, jako cel stosujemy spójność cyklu, aby upewnić się, że dana próbka danych może zostać poprawnie zrekonstruowana po sformułowaniu jako tekst (i że próbki tekstowe mogą być odtworzone z danych). Zarówno w odniesieniu do E2E, jak i WebNLG, pokazujemy, że ten słabo nadzorowany paradygmat treningowy jest w stanie przewyższyć w pełni nadzorowane modele sekwencji-sekwencji z mniej niż 10% zestawu treningowego. Wykorzystując wszystkie adnotacje danych, nasz model może zwiększyć wydajność standardowego modelu sekwencji-sekwencji o ponad pięć punktów BLEU, ustanawiając nowy stan sztuki na obu zbiorach danych.', 'ro': 'Pentru multe domenii noi de aplicații pentru generarea de date-la-text, principalul obstacol în formarea modelelor neurale constă în lipsa datelor de formare. În timp ce, de obicei, sunt disponibile un număr mare de instanțe pe partea de date, adesea sunt disponibile doar foarte puține mostre de text. Pentru a aborda această problemă, propunem aici o nouă abordare cu câteva lovituri pentru acest cadru. Abordarea noastră extinde automat datele disponibile pentru formare prin (i) generarea de noi mostre de text bazate pe înlocuirea valorilor specifice cu cele alternative din aceeași categorie, (ii) generarea de noi mostre de text bazate pe GPT-2 și (iii) propunerea unei metode automate de asociere a noilor mostre de text cu mostre de date. Deoarece augmentarea textului poate introduce zgomot în datele de antrenament, folosim coerența ciclului ca obiectiv, pentru a ne asigura că un anumit eșantion de date poate fi reconstruit corect după ce a fost formulat ca text (și că eșantioanele de text pot fi reconstruite din date). Atât pentru E2E, cât și pentru WebNLG, arătăm că această paradigmă de instruire slab supravegheată este capabilă să depășească modelele secvență-la-secvență complet supravegheate cu mai puțin de 10% din setul de instruire. Prin utilizarea tuturor datelor adnotate, modelul nostru poate crește performanța unui model standard secvență-la-secvență cu peste 5 puncte BLEU, stabilind un nou stat-of-the-art pe ambele seturi de date.', 'so': 'Goobaha codsiga cusub ee macluumaadka-saxanka loogu talagalay waxaa ku jira qalabka ugu weyn ee ku tababarida modelalka neurada, waxaana laga baahan yahay baahida macluumaadka waxbarashada. Inta caadiga ah waxaa laga helaa dhinaca macluumaadka tusaalooyin badan, inta badan waxaa laga helaa samooyin qoraal ah oo yar. Si aan u qabsado dhibaatadan, halkan waxaynu horumarinaynaa qaab aad u dhaqdhaqaaqdo saxda. Dhaqdhaqaaqyadayada ayaa si automatic ah u bandhigaya macluumaadka waxbarashada lagu heli karo (i) oo samooyin cusub oo qoraal ah oo ku saleynaya qiimaha gaarka ah oo ay kuwa kale ka beddelaan isku nooc, (ii) oo samooyin cusub oo text ah oo ku saleysan GPT-2, iyo (iii) oo u soo jeedinaya qaab bilowga ah oo ay samooyinka qoraalka ee cusub ku isku dayaan samooyinka macluumaadka. Sida uu qoraalka la kordhinayo cod u soo bandhigi karo macluumaadka waxbarashada, waxaynu isugu isticmaalnaa baaskiil isku mid ah, si a an u xaqiijinno in samoolka data la siiyo si hagaagsan looga dhisi karo marka loo sameeyo qoraal ahaan (samooyinka qoraalka waxaa laga dhisi karaa macluumaadka). Heeganka E2E iyo WebNLG labadoodaba waxaynu tusnaynaa in paradigimtan tababarka la ilaaliyey uu awoodo in uu sameyn karo qaababka la ilaaliyo xilliga-dugaagga, waxayna ka yar tahay 10% ee koorasyada waxbarashada. Isku isticmaalidda macluumaadka la caddeeyey oo dhan, modellkayagu wuxuu ku kordhi karaa sameynta modelka standard-to-xiddig oo ka badan 5 barta BLEU, wuxuuna sameyn karaa xaalad cusub oo farshaxan ah labada sawirada.', 'si': 'දත්ත තියෙන්න තියෙන්න අළුත් වැඩසටහන් විදියට, ප්\u200dරධාන න්\u200dයූරාල මොඩේල්ස් විදියට ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තිය සාමාන්\u200dය විශාලයෙන් දත්ත පැත්තේ ලොකු සංඛ්යාවක් තියෙනවා නමුත්, සාමාන්\u200dය විශාල විතරයි පාළ මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබීමට, අපි මෙතන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා මේ සැකසුම් වෙනුවෙන්. අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා අළුත් පාළුවන් සැම්පල් සිදුවීම සඳහා අලුත් පාළුවන් ස්ථාපනය සඳහා විශේෂ විශ පාළුවන් විශාලනය පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරධානය දත්ත විදිහට ශබ්දයක් පෙන්වන්න, අපි සායික්ල සාම්ප්\u200dරධාන විදිහට අරමුණ විදිහට භාවිත කරන්න, දෙන්න E2E සහ WebNLG බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දෙන්නම්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ දුර්වලින් බලාපොරොත්තු ප්\u200dරධාන පාර්ඩිග්මය පුළුවන් පුළුවන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප සියළුම දත්ත පාවිච්චි කරන්න, අපේ මොඩල් එක ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ලැබෙන්න පුළුවන් බ්ලූස් පණිවිධි පණිවිධි පණිවිධි පණිවිධි පණ', 'sr': 'Za mnoge nove domene aplikacije za generaciju podataka do teksta, glavna prepreka u obuci neuralnih modela sastoji se od nedostatka podataka o obuci. Iako su obično dostupni veliki broj instancija na podacima, često su dostupni samo malo uzorka teksta. Da bi riješili ovaj problem, predlažemo novi pristup nekoliko pucnjava za ovu postavku. Naš pristup automatski povećava dostupne podatke za obuku i) stvaranja novih uzorka teksta na temelju zamjene specifičnih vrijednosti alternativnim uzorcima iz iste kategorije, ii) stvaranja novih uzorka teksta na temelju GPT-2, i iii) predlažeći automatsku metodu za parenje novih uzorka teksta sa uzorcima podataka. Pošto povećanje teksta može predstaviti buku podacima o obuci, koristimo konsistenciju ciklusa kao objektiv, kako bi se uverili da se uzorak podataka može ispravno rekonstruisati nakon formuliranja kao tekst (i da se uzorci teksta mogu rekonstruisati iz podataka). Na standardima E2E i WebNLG pokazujemo da ova slaba nadzorna paradigma treninga može izvršiti potpuno nadzorne modele sekvence do sekvence sa manjim od 10% treninga. Koristeći sve annotirane podatke, naš model može povećati učinkovitost standardnog model a sekvence do sekvence preko 5 bodova BLEU-a, uspostavljajući novo stanje umjetnosti na oba seta podataka.', 'sv': 'För många nya applikationsområden för data-till-text generation består det största hindret i träning av neurala modeller av brist på träningsdata. Även om det vanligtvis finns ett stort antal instanser tillgängliga på datasidan, är det ofta bara mycket få textprover tillgängliga. För att ta itu med detta problem föreslår vi här en ny strategi för denna miljö. Vårt tillvägagångssätt utökar automatiskt de data som finns tillgängliga för utbildning genom att (i) generera nya textprover baserade på att ersätta specifika värden med alternativa värden från samma kategori, (ii) generera nya textprover baserade på GPT-2, och (iii) föreslå en automatisk metod för parkoppling av nya textprover med dataprover. Eftersom textförstärkningen kan introducera buller i träningsdata använder vi cykelkonsekvens som mål för att säkerställa att ett visst dataprov kan rekonstrueras korrekt efter att ha formulerats som text (och att textprover kan rekonstrueras från data). På både E2E- och WebNLG-riktmärkena visar vi att detta svagt övervakade träningsparadigm kan överträffa fullt övervakade sekvens-till-sekvensmodeller med mindre än 10% av träningsuppsättningen. Genom att använda all kommenterad data kan vår modell öka prestandan för en standardsekvens-till-sekvensmodell med över 5 BLEU-punkter, vilket skapar en ny toppmodern för båda datauppsättningarna.', 'ta': 'தரவு- உரை உருவாக்கத்திற்கான புதிய பயன்பாட்டு களங்களுக்கு, புதிய புதிய பாதுகாப்பு மாதிரிகளில் பயிற்சி தரவு குறைவ வழக்கமாக பெரிய நிகழ்வுகள் தகவல் பக்கத்தில் இருக்கும் போது, பெரும்பாலும் சில உரை மாதிரிகள் கிடைக்கும். இந்த பிரச்சனையை முகவரிப்பதற்கு, நாம் இங்கே இந்த அமைப்பிற்கான ஒரு புதிய புதைய சில தோற்றம் செய்ய ம எங்கள் அணுக்கம் தானாகவே பயிற்சிக்கு கிடைக்கும் தகவலை உருவாக்குகிறது (i) புதிய உரை மாதிரிகளை மாற்றும் வகையிலிருந்து மாற்றும் வேறு வகையிலிருந்து மாற்றும் மதிப்புகளை உருவாக்குகிறது,  உரை சேர்ப்பு பயிற்சி தரவுக்கு ஒலியை குறிப்பிட முடியும் போது, நாம் சுழற்சி செல்லும் பொருளாக பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், கொடுக்கப்பட்ட தரவு மாதிரி உரை உருவாக்கப்பட்ட பிறக E2E மற்றும் வலை NLG குறிப்புகளிலும், இந்த பயிற்சி அளபுருவிலும் முழுமையாக கண்காணிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது என்பதை காண்பிக்கிறோம். பயிற்சி அமைப்பில் 10%  அனைத்து அறிவிக்கப்பட்ட தகவல்களையும் பயன்படுத்தி நமது மாதிரி நிலையான தொடர்ச்சி மாதிரியின் செயல்பாட்டை 5 பிலியு புள்ளிகள் மேல் அதிகரிக்கலாம், இரு தரவு', 'ur': 'بہت سی نو کاربرد ڈومین کے لئے ڈاٹ سے ٹیکسٹ نسل کے لئے، نئورل نمڈلوں کی تعلیم میں سب سے زیادہ زیادہ بازداشت ہے جسے تعلیم دی جائے گی. اگرچہ معمولاً بہت سی نمونے ڈیٹا جانب پر موجود ہیں، بہت ہی کم نمونے موجود ہیں۔ اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں ہم یہاں ایک کم شٹ کی تقریبا پیش کریں گے۔ ہمارا طریقہ آزاد کرتا ہے کہ (i) کے ذریعہ تدریس کے لئے نیا ٹکسٹ نمونڈے پیدا کئے جاتے ہیں جو ایک ہی کاٹی سے مختلف مقداروں سے بدل دیتے ہیں، اور (ii) GPT-2 پر آزاد نو ٹکسٹ نمونڈے پیدا کئے جاتے ہیں، اور (iii) نیا ٹکسٹ نمونڈوں کو ڈیٹ نمونڈوں کے ساتھ جوڑنے کے لئے آزاد جس طرح متن اضافہ کی جاتی ہے کہ تدریس ڈیٹا کے ساتھ صدا پیش کرسکتا ہے، ہم ایک موضوع کے طور پر سائکل موضوع کا استعمال کرتے ہیں، تاکہ مطمئن کریں کہ ایک دکھائی ڈیٹا نمونڈ کو متن کے طور پر فرمول ہونے کے بعد ٹھیک طرح تدریج کر سکتا ہے (اور یہ متن نمونڈے ڈیٹا E2E اور WebNLG بنچم مارک دونوں پر، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ یہ کمزور نظارت کی آموزش پارادیگ پورے نظارت کی سطح سے کم 10% سے زیادہ نظارت کی مدل کرسکتا ہے. تمام انٹیٹ ڈیٹوں کو استعمال کرنا کے ذریعہ، ہمارا موڈل ایک استاندارڈ سٹ-سے-کٹ-کٹ-کٹ-کٹ موڈل کے عملکرد کو 5 BLEU پوینٹوں سے زیادہ زیادہ بڑھ سکتا ہے، اور دونوں ڈیٹ سٹوں پر ایک نئی ایٹ-کٹ', 'vi': 'Đối với nhiều lĩnh vực ứng dụng mới trong việc sản xuất dữ liệu qua văn bản, trở ngại chính trong việc huấn luyện các mô hình thần kinh là thiếu dữ liệu huấn luyện. Trong khi thường có rất nhiều trường hợp xuất hiện bên dữ liệu, thường thì chỉ có rất ít mẫu văn bản có sẵn. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề xuất một cách tiếp cận mới nhất trong trường hợp này. Cách tiếp cận của chúng ta sẽ tự động tăng cường dữ liệu có sẵn để đào tạo bằng cách (i) tạo ra các mẫu văn bản mới dựa trên việc thay thế giá trị đặc biệt bằng các giá trị khác nhau trong cùng một hạng, rồi sau đó tạo ra các mẫu văn bản mới dựa trên GPT-2, và (III) đề xuất một phương pháp tự động để ghép các mẫu văn bản mới với mẫu dữ liệu. Khi phần văn bản gia tăng có thể gây ồn ào với dữ liệu huấn luyện, chúng tôi dùng tính đồng nhất của chu kỳ để đảm bảo một mẫu dữ liệu có thể được tái tạo chính xác sau khi đã được cấu hình thành chữ (và các mẫu văn bản có thể phục hồi từ dữ liệu). Với cả những tiêu chuẩn E2E và WebNLG, chúng tôi cho thấy rằng trình mô hình huấn luyện thiếu sót có khả năng được giám sát vượt qua trình tự giám sát đầy đủ với chưa tới mười lớp của bộ huấn luyện. Bằng cách sử dụng tất cả các dữ liệu được ghi chú, mẫu của chúng ta có thể tăng hiệu quả của mô hình dãy-tới-trình mô-lát tiêu chuẩn bằng hơn cả 5nguyên tắc LEU, tạo ra một trình độ mới trên cả hai bộ dữ liệu.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis @ info: whatsthis Bu muammolarni boshqarish uchun biz bu moslama uchun bir necha yordam yordamni rivojlanamiz. Bizning usuli GPT-2 asosida yangi matn misollarini boshqa qiymatlarni almashtirish asosida yangi matn misollarini (i) avtomatik yaratish va (i ii) maʼlumot misollari bilan birga birlashtirish uchun yangi matn misollarini yaratish mumkin. @ info E2E va WebNLG parametrlarida, biz bu taʼminlovchi qo'llanmani ko'rsatganimizni ko'rsatdik, bu taʼminlovchi paradigm taʼminlovchi 10% dan kichkina ko'paytirilgan sequence to'xtatish modellarini bajarishi mumkin. Barcha taʼminlovchi maʼlumot yordamida modelmiz 5 dan ortiq sequence modelini bajarishi mumkin. Bu ikkita maʼlumot satrda yangi sanar holatini yaratish mumkin.", 'bg': 'За много нови области на приложение за генериране на данни към текст основната пречка при обучението на невронни модели се състои в липсата на данни за обучение. Въпреки че обикновено има голям брой примери от страната на данните, често са налични само много малко текстови образци. За да се справим с този проблем, тук предлагаме нов подход за няколко изстрела за тази обстановка. Нашият подход автоматично увеличава наличните данни за обучение чрез (i) генериране на нови текстови образци въз основа на заместване на конкретни стойности с алтернативни от същата категория, (ii) генериране на нови текстови образци въз основа на GPT-2 и (iii) предлагане на автоматичен метод за сдвояване на новите текстови образци с образци от данни. Тъй като увеличаването на текста може да въведе шум в данните за обучение, ние използваме последователността на цикъла като цел, за да се уверим, че дадена проба от данни може да бъде правилно реконструирана, след като е формулирана като текст (и че текстовите проби могат да бъдат реконструирани от данни). Както по показателите E2E, така и WebNLG показваме, че тази слабо контролирана тренировъчна парадигма е в състояние да надмине напълно контролираните модели последователност към последователност с по-малко от 10% от тренировъчния набор. Използвайки всички анотирани данни, нашият модел може да увеличи производителността на стандартен модел последователност към последователност с над 5 точки, създавайки ново състояние на изкуството и на двата набора от данни.', 'da': 'For mange nye anvendelsesområder til data-til-tekst generering består den største hindring i træning af neurale modeller af manglende træningsdata. Mens der normalt er et stort antal forekomster tilgængelige på datasiden, er der ofte kun meget få tekstprøver tilgængelige. For at løse dette problem foreslår vi her en ny tilgang til disse rammer. Vores tilgang øger automatisk de data, der er tilgængelige for træning, ved at (i) generere nye tekstprøver baseret på at erstatte specifikke værdier med alternative værdier fra samme kategori, (ii) generere nye tekstprøver baseret på GPT-2 og (iii) foreslå en automatisk metode til parring af de nye tekstprøver med dataprøver. Da tekstforøgelsen kan indføre støj til træningsdataene, bruger vi cykluskonsistens som mål for at sikre, at en given dataprøve kan rekonstrueres korrekt efter at være formuleret som tekst (og at tekstprøver kan rekonstrueres ud fra data). På både E2E og WebNLG benchmarks viser vi, at dette svagt overvågede træningsparademe er i stand til at overgå fuldt overvågede sekvens-til-sekvensmodeller med mindre end 10% af træningssættet. Ved at udnytte alle annoterede data kan vores model øge ydeevnen af en standard sekvens-til-sekvens model med over 5 BLEU-punkter, hvilket skaber en ny state-of-the-art på begge datasæt.', 'nl': 'Voor veel nieuwe toepassingsgebieden voor data-to-text generatie is het grootste obstakel bij het trainen van neurale modellen een gebrek aan trainingsdata. Hoewel meestal grote aantallen exemplaren beschikbaar zijn aan de datazijde, zijn vaak slechts zeer weinig tekstvoorbeelden beschikbaar. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, stellen we hier een nieuwe few-shot benadering voor voor deze setting. Onze aanpak breidt automatisch de gegevens uit die beschikbaar zijn voor training door (i) nieuwe tekstvoorbeelden te genereren op basis van het vervangen van specifieke waarden door alternatieve waarden uit dezelfde categorie, (ii) nieuwe tekstvoorbeelden te genereren op basis van GPT-2, en (iii) een automatische methode voor het koppelen van nieuwe tekstvoorbeelden met gegevensvoorbeelden voor te stellen. Omdat de tekstvergroting ruis in de trainingsgegevens kan brengen, gebruiken we cyclusconsistentie als doelstelling, om ervoor te zorgen dat een gegeven datamonster correct kan worden gereconstrueerd nadat het als tekst is geformuleerd (en dat tekstmonsters uit data kunnen worden gereconstrueerd). Op zowel de E2E als WebNLG benchmarks laten we zien dat dit zwak begeleide trainingsparadigma in staat is om volledig begeleide sequence-to-sequence modellen te overtreffen met minder dan 10% van de trainingsset. Door gebruik te maken van alle geannoteerde gegevens, kan ons model de prestaties van een standaard sequentie-to-sequence model verhogen met meer dan vijf BLEU punten, waardoor een nieuwe state-of-the-art op beide datasets wordt gecreëerd.', 'hr': 'Za mnoge nove domene primjene za generaciju podataka do teksta, glavna prepreka u obuku neuronskih modela sastoji se od nedostatka podataka o obuci. Iako su obično dostupni veliki broj slučajeva na podacima, često su dostupni samo malo uzorka teksta. Da riješimo ovaj problem, ovdje predlažemo novi pristup nekoliko pucnjava za ovu postavku. Naš pristup automatski povećava dostupne podatke za obuku s i) proizvodnjom novih uzorka teksta na temelju zamjene specifičnih vrijednosti alternativnim vrijednostima iz iste kategorije, ii) proizvodnjom novih uzorka teksta na temelju GPT-2, i iii) predlažeći automatsku metodu za parenje novih uzorka teksta s uzorcima podataka. Povećanje teksta može predstaviti buku podacima o obuci, koristimo konsistenciju ciklusa kao objektiv kako bi se osigurali da se uzorak podataka može ispravno rekonstruirati nakon formuliranja kao tekst (i da se uzorak teksta može rekonstruirati iz podataka). Na standardima E2E i WebNLG pokazujemo da ova slaba nadzorna paradigma obuke može izvršiti potpuno nadzorne modele u sekvenciji s manjim od 10% obuke. Koristeći sve annotirane podatke, naš model može povećati učinkovitost standardnog model a sekvence do sekvence preko 5 bodova BLEU-a, uspostavljajući novo stanje umjetnosti na obje podatke.', 'id': 'Untuk banyak domain aplikasi baru untuk generasi data-ke-teks, halangan utama dalam pelatihan model saraf terdiri dari kekurangan data pelatihan. Walaupun biasanya jumlah besar kasus tersedia di sisi data, sering hanya sedikit sampel teks tersedia. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami di sini mengusulkan pendekatan baru beberapa tembakan untuk pengaturan ini. pendekatan kita secara otomatis meningkatkan data yang tersedia untuk pelatihan dengan (i) menghasilkan sampel teks baru berdasarkan menggantikan nilai spesifik dengan nilai alternatif dari kategori yang sama, (ii) menghasilkan sampel teks baru berdasarkan GPT-2, dan (iii) mengusulkan metode otomatis untuk pasang sampel teks baru dengan sampel data. Karena peningkatan teks dapat memperkenalkan suara pada data pelatihan, kami menggunakan konsistensi siklus sebagai sebuah objektif, untuk memastikan bahwa sampel data yang diberikan dapat dibangun dengan benar setelah telah ditentukan sebagai teks (dan sampel teks dapat dibangun kembali dari data). On both the E2E and WebNLG benchmarks, we show that this weakly supervised training paradigm is able to outperform fully supervised sequence-to-sequence models with less than 10% of the training set.  Dengan menggunakan semua data yang dicatat, model kita dapat meningkatkan prestasi model standar dari urutan ke urutan dengan lebih dari 5 poin BLEU, mendirikan state-of-the-art baru pada kedua dataset.', 'de': 'Für viele neue Anwendungsbereiche zur Daten-zu-Text-Generierung besteht das Haupthindernis beim Training neuronaler Modelle in einem Mangel an Trainingsdaten. Während auf der Datenseite meist eine große Anzahl von Instanzen zur Verfügung stehen, stehen oft nur sehr wenige Textbeispiele zur Verfügung. Um dieses Problem anzugehen, schlagen wir hier einen neuartigen Few-Shot-Ansatz für dieses Setting vor. Unser Ansatz erweitert automatisch die für das Training verfügbaren Daten, indem (i) neue Textbeispiele generiert werden, die auf dem Ersetzen bestimmter Werte durch alternative Werte derselben Kategorie basieren, (ii) neue Textbeispiele basierend auf GPT-2 generiert und (iii) eine automatische Methode vorgeschlagen wird, um die neuen Textbeispiele mit Datenbeispielen zu paaren. Da die Textaugmentation Rauschen in die Trainingsdaten bringen kann, verwenden wir Zykluskonsistenz als Ziel, um sicherzustellen, dass eine bestimmte Datenprobe korrekt rekonstruiert werden kann, nachdem sie als Text formuliert wurde (und dass Textproben aus Daten rekonstruiert werden können). Sowohl am E2E- als auch am WebNLG-Benchmark zeigen wir, dass dieses schwach überwachte Trainingsparadigma in der Lage ist, vollständig überwachte Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Modelle mit weniger als 10% des Trainingssatzes zu übertreffen. Durch die Verwendung aller annotierten Daten kann unser Modell die Leistung eines Standard-Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Modells um über fünf BLEU-Punkte steigern und einen neuen Stand der Technik auf beiden Datensätzen etablieren.', 'ko': '데이터가 텍스트에 생성되는 많은 새로운 응용 분야에서 훈련 신경 모델의 주요 장애는 훈련 데이터가 부족하다는 데 있다.데이터 단말기는 일반적으로 대량의 실례를 사용할 수 있지만, 보통 아주 적은 텍스트 견본만 사용할 수 있다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해서 우리는 이곳에서 새로운 소렌즈 방법을 제기하였다.우리의 방법은 (i)를 통해 특정 값을 같은 종류의 대체 값으로 바꾸어 새로운 텍스트 샘플을 생성하고, (ii)는 GPT-2를 바탕으로 새로운 텍스트 샘플을 생성하며, (iii)는 새로운 텍스트 샘플과 데이터 샘플을 조합하는 자동 방법을 제시하여 훈련에 사용할 수 있는 데이터를 자동으로 강화한다.텍스트 강화는 훈련 데이터에 소음을 도입하기 때문에 우리는 주어진 데이터 샘플이 텍스트로 표현된 후에 정확하게 재구성될 수 있도록 순환 일치성을 목표로 한다. (데이터에서 텍스트 샘플을 재구성할 수 있다.)E2E와 웹NLG 기준에서 우리는 이런 약한 감독 훈련 모델이 훈련 집합이 10%도 안 되는 상황에서 완전 감독 서열 대 서열 모델보다 우수하다는 것을 증명했다.주석이 있는 모든 데이터를 활용하여 우리 모델은 표준 서열에서 서열 모델까지의 성능을 5개 BLEU점 이상 향상시켜 이 두 데이터 집합에 새로운 최신 수준을 세울 수 있다.', 'fa': 'برای بسیاری از دامنهای کاربرد جدید برای نسل داده و متن، بازداشت اصلی در آموزش مدل عصبی از کمبود داده های آموزش است. در حالی که معمولا تعداد زیادی از نمونه\u200cها در طرف داده\u200cها موجود می\u200cشوند، اغلب فقط چند نمونه\u200cهای متن در دسترس هستند. برای حل این مشکل، ما اینجا یک روش رمانی برای این تنظیم پیشنهاد می کنیم. دستور ما به طور خودکار اطلاعات موجود برای آموزش توسط (i) نمونه\u200cهای متن جدید را تولید می\u200cکند که بر اساس جایگزینش ارزش\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای با نمونه\u200cهای جایگزینی از یک kategoriه، و (ii) تولید نمونه\u200cهای متن جدید بر اساس GPT-2، و (iii) پیشنهاد می\u200cکند نمونه\u200cهای متن جدید را با نمونه\u200cهای داده\u200c همانطور که افزایش متن می\u200cتواند صدا را به داده\u200cهای آموزش معرفی کند، ما به عنوان یک هدف استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا مطمئن شویم که نمونه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای داده\u200cای که داده شده\u200cاند می\u200cتوانند درست پس از فرمول\u200cشدن به عنوان متن (و نمونه\u200cهای متن می\u200cتوانند از داده\u200cها بازسازی شوند در هر دو نقشه\u200cهای E2E و WebNLG نشان می\u200cدهیم که این پارادیگ آموزش\u200cهای ضعیف تحت نظر گرفته می\u200cتواند مدل\u200cهای کامل تحت نظر گرفته\u200cاند با کمتر از 10 درصد از مجموعه آموزش را انجام دهد. با استفاده از تمام داده\u200cهای مشخص شده، مدل ما می\u200cتواند عملکرد یک مدل استاندارد به رده\u200cای با بیشتر از ۵ نقطه بلوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئو', 'af': "Vir baie nuwe toepassingsdomeine vir data- to- text generasie, die hoofobstakle in opvoering neurale modele bestaan van 'n ontbreek van onderwerp data. Als gewoonlik groot aantal voorbeelde is beskikbaar op die data kant, dikwels is slegs baie paar teks voorbeelde beskikbaar. Om hierdie probleem te adres, stel ons hier 'n novel paar-skoot toegang vir hierdie opstelling. Ons toegang automaties vergroot die data beskikbaar vir onderwerp deur (i) genereer nuwe teks voorbeelde gebaseer op vervang van spesifieke waardes deur alternatiewe waardes van dieselfde kategorie, (ii) genereer nuwe teks voorbeelde gebaseer op GPT-2, en (iii) voorstel 'n automatiese metode vir paar van die nuwe teks voorbeelde met data voorbeelde. Soos die teks vergroot kan geluid voorsien a an die onderwerp data, gebruik ons syklus konsistensie as 'n doel, om seker te maak dat 'n gegewe data-voorbeeld korrek herstel kan word na wees geformeer as teks (en dat teks-voorbeelde kan herstel word van data). Op beide die E2E en WebNLG benchmarke, wys ons dat hierdie swak ondersoekte oefening paradigme kan uitvoer volledig ondersoekte volgorde volgorde-na-volgorde modele met minder as 10% van die oefening stel. Deur die gebruik van alle aanmerkte data, kan ons model die effektiviteit van 'n standaard sekwensie-na-sekwensie model vergroot deur oor 5 BLES punte, met die opstelling van 'n nuwe staat-van-kuns op beide datastelle.", 'tr': 'Data we tekst döredilmesi üçin köp täze sahypa üçin näus nural modelleri eğitirmek üçin esasy engel bar. Adatça birnäçe örnekler data tarapynda ulaşılýar, köplenç diňe birnäçe metin örnekleri ulaşılýar. Bu meseleyi çözmek üçin, biz bu düzümler üçin romanlaryň azajyk taýýarlamagy teklip edýäris. Biziň ýaryşymyz (i) okuwçylyk üçin bar maglumatlary otomatik bilen üýtgedýär (i) täze metin nusgalaryny meňzeş kategoriýadan belli mykdarlar üçin üýtgedýär, (ii) GPT-2 daýan ýan täze metin nusgalaryny döretýär, we (iii) täze metin nusgalaryny üçin awtomatik täze metin nusgalaryny üç Metin bejermek maglumaty üçin sesi okuw maglumaty bilen tanyşdyryp bilýän bolsa, biz wagtyň durnuklylygyny bir maksady hökmünde ullanýarys. Berilen maglumatyň nusgasyny metin hökmünde täzeden düzgün döredilip bardygyny barlamak üçin (we metin nusgalary maglumatdan ýene-döredilebili E2E we WebNLG düzeltmeklerinde, bu azajyk gözetleýän eğitim paradigmanyň 10% den az şekilde gözetleýän düzeltmesi başarýar. Hemme täze hasaplanýan maglumatlary ulanarak, biziň modelimiz 5 BLEU noktalarynda standart hatlaryň netijesini hem berüş setirlerinde täze bir möhüm durumyny bejerip biler.', 'sw': 'Kwa maeneo mengi mapya ya matumizi kwa ajili ya kizazi cha taarifa hadi maandishi, vikwazo vikuu kikuu katika mafunzo ya mifano ya neurali ni ukosefu wa taarifa za mafunzo. Wakati mara nyingi matukio mengi yanapatikana kwenye upande wa taarifa, mara nyingi tu sampuli chache za maandishi zinapatikana. Ili kukabiliana na tatizo hili, hapa tunapendekeza mbinu za riwaya kadhaa za kuchukua hatua hii. Hatua yetu inatengeneza taarifa zinazopatikana kwa mafunzo na (i) kutengeneza sampuli mpya za maandishi kwa kutumia kubadilisha thamani maalum na wale mbadala kutoka katika kundi hilo, (ii) kutengeneza sampuli mpya za maandishi kwa msingi wa GPT-2, na (iii) kupendekeza njia ya kujitegemea ili kuwachanganya sampuli mpya za maandishi kwa sampuli za data. Kama kuongezea ujumbe wa maandishi unavyoweza kutangaza sauti kwa takwimu za mafunzo, tunatumia mzunguko huo kama lengo, ili kuhakikisha kuwa mtindo wa data unaweza kutengenezwa sahihi baada ya kutengenezwa kama maandishi (na sampuli za maandishi inaweza kujengwa tena kutoka kwenye taarifa). Kwenye misingi ya E2E na WebNLG, tunaonyesha kuwa utaratibu huu wa mafunzo unaothibitishwa dhaifu unaweza kutekeleza mifano ya kufuatiliwa kwa mfululizo wa mfululizo na chini ya asilimia 10 ya seti ya mafunzo. Kwa kutumia taarifa zote zilizotajwa, mwelekeo wetu unaweza kuongeza ufanisi wa muundo wa kiwango cha mfululizo wa mfululizo wa kiwango cha kawaida kwa zaidi ya pointi 5 BLEU, kutengeneza hali mpya ya ya sanaa kwenye seti zote za data.', 'sq': 'Për shumë fusha të reja aplikimi për gjenerimin e të dhënave në tekst, pengesa kryesore në trajnimin e modeleve nervore përbëhet nga mungesa e të dhënave të trajnimit. Ndërsa zakonisht numra të mëdha rastesh janë në dispozicion në anën e të dhënave, shpesh janë në dispozicion vetëm pak shembuj teksti. To address this problem, we here propose a novel few-shot approach for this setting.  Përqasja jonë automatikisht rrit të dhënat në dispozicion për trajnimin duke (i) gjeneruar mostra të reja teksti bazuar në zëvendësimin e vlerave specifike me ato alternative nga e njëjta kategori, (ii) gjeneruar mostra të reja teksti bazuar në GPT-2 dhe (iii) propozuar një metodë automatike për të barazuar mostrat e reja teksti me mostrat e të dhënave. Ndërsa rritja e tekstit mund të futë zhurmë në të dhënat e stërvitjes, ne përdorim konsistencën e ciklit si një objektiv, me qëllim që të sigurohemi se një moshë e dhënë mund të rindërtohet korrekt pasi të jetë formuluar si tekst (dhe se moshët e tekstit mund të rindërtohen nga të dhënat). Në pikat e referimit të E2E dhe WebNLG, ne tregojmë se ky paradigm ë trajnimi i mbikqyrur dobësisht është në gjendje të kalojë modelet e mbikqyrur plotësisht nga sekuenca në sekuencë me më pak se 10% të grupit të trajnimit. Duke përdorur të gjitha të dhënat e anotuara, modeli ynë mund të rritë performancën e një modeli standart sekuencë-në-sekuencë me mbi 5 pikë BLEU, duke ngritur një gjendje të re aktuale në të dy datasets.', 'am': 'ለብዙ አዲስ ፕሮግራም ዶሜኖች ለዳታ-ወደ-ጽሑፍ ትውልድ የሚደረገው የናውሮል ዓይነቶች ማስተማር የዋና ግንኙነት የሞክራዊ ዳታ ሲጎድል፡፡ በተለመደው ጊዜ የጽሑፍ ዓይነቶች በዳታ ማውጣት ላይ ብዙ instances ሲገኙ ብዙ ጊዜ ብቻ ጥቂቶች ምሳሌዎች ይገኛሉ፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለመቀላቀል፣ ለዚህ ማስተካከል የጥቂት ነጥብ ልማድ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የአዲስ ጽሑፍ ምሳሌዎች በተለዩ ክፍሎች ላይ በመለወጥ (i i) አዲስ የጽሑፍ ምሳሌዎች በGPT-2 በሚያሳዩ አዲስ ጽሑፍ ምሳሌዎችን በመለወጥ (i) እና (iii) አዲስ ጽሑፍ ምሳሌዎችን በመጠቀም አዲስ የጽሑፍ ምሳሌዎችን በአዲስ ምሳሌዎች ማሳካት እና (አዲስ) አዲስ የጽሑፍ ምሳሌዎችን በመጠቀም የራስቶማዊ ጥያቄ ማድረግ ማቅረብ ያሳስባ የጽሑፍ ማውጣት የድምፅ ድምፅ ለመማረጃ ዳታዎችን ለማስታወቅ እንደሚችል፣ የተሰጠ ዳታ ምሳሌ እንደ ጽሑፍ ካደረገ በኋላ እንዲያስተካክል እናስታውቃለን (የጽሑፉ ምሳሌዎች ከዳታዎች ሊሰነስ ይችላል)፡ On both the E2E and WebNLG benchmarks, we show that this weakly supervised training paradigm is able to outperform fully supervised sequence-to-sequence models with less than 10% of the training set.  በተጠቃሚ ዳታዎች ሁሉ በመጠቀም ሞዴላዎቻችን የዳታር ምርጫዎችን በ5 ቢልዩን አዲስ የ-የ-art ሁኔታ በሁለቱ ዳታዎች ላይ ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡', 'bn': 'তথ্য থেকে টেক্সট প্রজন্মের জন্য অনেক নতুন অ্যাপ্লিকেশন ডোমেনের জন্য, নিউরেল মডেল প্রশিক্ষণের প্রধান বাধাগুলো প্রশ যদিও সাধারণত তথ্য পাশে বিশাল সংখ্যা পাওয়া যায়, প্রায়শ শুধুমাত্র কয়েকটি টেক্সট নম্বাল পাওয়া যায়। এই সমস্যাটিকে ঠিক করার জন্য আমরা এখানে এই বৈশিষ্ট্যের জন্য একটি কয়েকটা গুলি প্রস্তাব করি। আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য প্রাপ্ত তথ্য স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে যোগ করে (i) নতুন টেক্সট নমুনা তৈরি করে একই বিকল্পের মান প্রতিস্থাপনের ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিতে বিকল যেহেতু টেক্সট অ্যাগগমেন্টেশন প্রশিক্ষণ তথ্যের কাছে কণ্ঠস্বর উপস্থাপন করতে পারে, আমরা সাইকেলের উদ্দেশ্য হিসেবে ব্যবহার করি, যাতে নিশ্চিত করতে পারি যে একটি প্রদত্ত তথ্যের ন ইউ২ই এবং ওয়েব এনএলজি বেনম্যার্ক উভয়েই আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই দুর্বল প্রশিক্ষণের প্যারাডিম পুরোপুরি পর্যবেক্ষন করা প্রশিক্ষণের মডেলের মাধ্যমে প্রশিক্ষণ সকল বিরক্তিকর তথ্য ব্যবহার করে আমাদের মডেল ৫ বিলিউ বিন্দুর মাধ্যমে একটি স্ট্যান্ডারেন্ড সেকেন্ড-ব্যাক-সেকেন্ড মডেলের প্রদর্শন বৃদ্ধি করতে পারে, উভয়', 'az': 'Data-to-text nəzəriyyəti üçün çox yeni uyğulama domenalar üçün, nöral modellərin təhsil etməsində ən böyük səbəbi təhsil məlumatlarının yoxdur. Genellik məlumat tərəfində böyük nümunələr faydalanır, çox az məlumat nümunələri faydalanır. Bu problemi çəkmək üçün, biz burada bu qurğuda yeni bir az fəsad tərzini təklif edirik. Bizim metodumuz, i) ilə müəyyən edilən təhsil üçün istifadə edilənlər üçün yeni mətn nümunələri yaratmaq üçün istifadə edilənlər üçün istifadə edir; ii) GPT-2 tabanlı yeni mətn nümunələrini yaratmaq üçün yeni mətn nümunələrini verir; iii) yeni mətn nümunələrini mətnlərin nümunələrlə birləşdirmək üçün avtomatik metodu təklif edir. Mətn artırması təhsil məlumatlarına səs göstərə biləcəyi kimi, biz məlumatların məlumatlarından yenidən in şa ediləcəyini əmin etmək üçün məlumatların məlumatların düzgün inşa edilməsini və məlumatların məlumatlarının məlumatlarından yenidən inşa ediləcəyini təsdiqləyib istifadə edirik. E2E və WebNLG benchmarklərində, bu zəif gözləyirli təhsil paradigmi tamamilə gözləyirli sequence-to-sequence modellərin 10% az olduğunu göstərək. Bütün məlumatları istifadə edərək, modellərimiz standart sequence-to-sequence modelini 5 BLEU nöqtələrindən art ıra bilər, hər iki veri qurmaqlarında yeni məlumatların durumunu quraşdıra bilər.', 'hy': "Տվյալ-տեքստի ստեղծման շատ նոր ծրագրերի համար նյարդային մոդելների ուսուցման հիմնական խոչընդոտը կազմում է նյարդային մոդելների ուսուցման տվյալների բացակայությունը: Մինչդեռ սովորաբար շատ դեպքեր հասանելի են տվյալների կողմում, հաճախ շատ քիչ տեքստի նմուշներ են հասանելի: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք այստեղ առաջարկում ենք մի նոր մի քանի նկարների մոտեցում: Մեր մոտեցումը ինքնաբերաբար աճում է կրթության համար հասանելի տվյալները՝ i) ստեղծելով նոր տեքստի նմուշներ, հիմնված միևնույն կատեգորիայից հատուկ արժեքների փոխարինելու վրա, b) ստեղծելով նոր տեքստի նմուշներ, հիմնված GPT-2-ի վրա, և c) առաջարկելով ավտոմատիկ մե Քանի որ տեքստի աճը կարող է աղմուկ ներկայացնել ուսումնասիրության տվյալների մեջ, մենք օգտագործում ենք շրջանակի կայունությունը որպես օբյեկտիվ, որպեսզի համոզվենք, որ տվյալ տվյալների նմուշը կարելի է ճիշտ վերակառուցել տեքստի ձևավորման հետո (և որ տեքստի Ե2E-ի և ՎեբԼԳ-ի հարաբերականների վրա մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս թույլ վերահսկված վարժման պարադիգմը կարողանում է գերազանցել լիովին վերահսկված հաջորդականության մոդելներ' վարժման սարքի 10 տոկոսից քիչ: Օգտագործելով բոլոր annoted տվյալները, մեր մոդելը կարող է բարձրացնել ստանդարտ հաջորդականության մոդելի արտադրողությունը ավելի քան հինգ կետով, ստեղծելով նոր տեխնոլոգիա երկու տվյալների համակարգերում:", 'ca': "Per a molts nous dominys d'aplicació per a la generació de dades a text, l'obstacle principal en la formació de models neurals consisteix en la falta de dades d'entrenament. Mentre normalment hi ha molts casos disponibles a la banda de les dades, sovint només hi ha poques mostres de text disponibles. Per abordar aquest problem a, proposem un nou enfocament amb poces fotos per aquest entorn. El nostre enfocament augmenta automàticament les dades disponibles per a l'entrenament i) generant noves mostres de text basades en substituir valors específics per valors alternativs de la mateixa categoria, ii) generant noves mostres de text basades en GPT-2 i iii) proposant un mètode automàtic per a parellar les noves mostres de text amb mostres de dades. Com que l'augment del text pot introduir soroll a les dades d'entrenament, utilitzem la consistencia del cicle com un objectiu, per assegurar-nos que una mostra de dades pot ser reconstruida correctament després d'haver estat formulada com text (i que les mostras de text poden ser reconstruides a partir de les dades). Amb els punts de referència E2E i WebNLG, demostram que aquest paradigma d'entrenament debidament supervisat és capaç de superar models de seqüència a seqüència plenament supervisats amb menys del 10% del conjunt d'entrenaments. Utilitzant totes les dades anotates, el nostre model pot augmentar el rendiment d'un model de seqüència a seqüència estàndard en més de 5 punts BLEU, establient un nou avançat en ambdós conjunts de dades.", 'et': 'Paljude uute andmete tekst genereerimise rakendusvaldkondade puhul seisneb neuromudelite koolitamise peamiseks takistuseks treeninguandmete puudumine. Kuigi tavaliselt on andmepoolel saadaval suur hulk eksemplare, on sageli saadaval vaid väga vähe tekstinäidiseid. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks pakume siinkohal välja uudse mõne võimaluse lähenemisviisi. Meie lähenemisviis täiendab automaatselt koolituseks kättesaadavaid andmeid (i) luues uusi tekstinäidiseid, mis põhinevad konkreetsete väärtuste asendamisel alternatiivsete samast kategooriast pärit väärtustega, (ii) luues uusi tekstinäidiseid GPT-2 põhjal ja (iii) pakkudes välja automaatse meetodi uute tekstinäidiste sidumiseks andmenäidistega. Kuna teksti suurendamine võib tuua koolitusandmetele müra, kasutame eesmärgina tsükli järjepidevust, et kindlaks teha, et antud andmenäidis saab pärast tekstina sõnastamist korrektselt rekonstrueerida (ja et tekstinäidiseid saab andmetest rekonstrueerida). Nii E2E kui ka WebNLG võrdlusnäitajate põhjal näitame, et see nõrgalt järelevalvetud treeningparadigma suudab ületada täielikult järelevalvetud järjestuste mudeleid vähem kui 10% treeningkomplektist. Kasutades kõiki annoteeritud andmeid, võib meie mudel suurendada standardse jada-jada mudeli jõudlust rohkem kui 5 BLEU punkti võrra, luues mõlemale andmekogumile uue tehnika taseme.', 'bs': 'Za mnoge nove domene aplikacije za generaciju podataka do teksta, glavna prepreka u obuci neuronskih modela sastoji se od nedostatka podataka o obuci. Iako su obično dostupni veliki broj slučajeva na podacima, često su dostupni samo malo uzorka teksta. Da bi riješili ovaj problem, ovdje predlažemo novi pristup nekoliko pucnjava za ovu postavku. Naš pristup automatski povećava dostupne podatke za obuku s i) stvaranjem novih uzorka teksta na temelju zamjene specifičnih vrijednosti alternativnima iz iste kategorije, ii) stvaranjem novih uzorka teksta na temelju GPT-2, i iii) predlažeći automatsku metodu za parenje novih uzorka teksta s uzorcima podataka. Povećanje teksta može predstaviti buku podacima o obuci, koristimo konsistenciju ciklusa kao objektiv, kako bi se osigurali da se uzorak podataka može ispravno rekonstruisati nakon formuliranja kao tekst (i da se uzorak teksta može rekonstruisati iz podataka). Na standardima E2E i WebNLG pokazujemo da ova slaba nadzorna paradigma treninga može izvršiti potpuno nadzorne modele sekvence do sekvence sa manjim od 10% nastave treninga. Koristeći sve annotirane podatke, naš model može povećati učinkovitost standardnog model a sekvence do sekvence preko 5 bodova BLEU-a, uspostavljajući novo stanje umjetnosti na obje podatke.', 'cs': 'Pro mnoho nových aplikačních oblastí pro generování dat do textu je hlavní překážkou tréninkových neuronových modelů nedostatek tréninkových dat. Zatímco na datové straně je obvykle k dispozici velké množství instancí, často je k dispozici jen velmi málo vzorků textu. Pro řešení tohoto problému zde navrhujeme nový pár záběrů přístup k tomuto prostředí. Náš přístup automaticky rozšiřuje data dostupná pro školení (i) generováním nových vzorků textu založených na nahrazení konkrétních hodnot alternativními hodnotami ze stejné kategorie, (ii) generováním nových vzorků textu založených na GPT-2 a (iii) navržením automatické metody spárování nových vzorků textu s datovými vzorky. Vzhledem k tomu, že rozšíření textu může do tréninkových dat zavést hluk, používáme jako cíl konzistenci cyklu, abychom zajistili, že daný vzorek dat může být správně rekonstruován po formulaci textu (a že vzorky textu lze z dat rekonstruovat). Na E2E i WebNLG benchmarku ukazujeme, že tento slabě dohlížený tréninkový paradigmat je schopen překonat plně dohlížené sekvenční modely s menším než 10% tréninkové sady. Využitím všech anotovaných dat může náš model zvýšit výkon standardního modelu sekvence-sekvence o více než pět bodů BLEU, což vytvoří nový stav techniky na obou datových sadách.', 'fi': 'Monilla uusilla data-to-text-generoinnin sovellusalueilla neuromallien harjoittelun suurin este on harjoitusdatan puute. Vaikka datapuolella on yleensä suuri määrä esiintymiä, usein vain hyvin vähän tekstinäytteitä on saatavilla. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme tässä uutta muutaman laukauksen lähestymistapaa tähän tilanteeseen. Lähestymistapamme lisää automaattisesti harjoitteluun käytettävissä olevaa tietoa (i) luomalla uusia tekstinäytteitä, jotka perustuvat tiettyjen arvojen korvaamiseen vaihtoehtoisilla saman luokan arvoilla, (ii) luomalla uusia tekstinäytteitä GPT-2:n pohjalta ja (iii) ehdottamalla automaattista menetelmää uusien tekstinäytteiden parittamiseksi tietonäytteisiin. Koska tekstin lisääminen voi tuoda melua harjoitusdataan, käytämme syklin johdonmukaisuutta tavoitteenamme varmistaa, että tietty tietonäyte voidaan rekonstruoida oikein muotoiltuamme sen tekstiksi (ja että tekstinäytteet voidaan rekonstruoida datasta). Sekä E2E- että WebNLG-vertailuarvoissa osoitamme, että tämä heikosti valvottu harjoitusparadigma pystyy suoriutumaan täysin valvotuista sekvenssimalleista alle 10%:lla harjoittelusarjasta. Hyödyntämällä kaikkia annotoituja tietoja mallimme voi parantaa vakiomallin suorituskykyä sekvenssistä sekvenssiin yli viidellä BLEU-pisteellä, luoden uuden tekniikan molemmille aineistoille.', 'jv': 'Ana akeh aplikasi sing paling-sistem kanggo ngregani data-to-text, kuwi nggawe barang langgar nggawe model alat sing isin kuwi ora ono wektu nggawe data retungan. Sample Nyong ngomong mengko perbudhakan iki, kita ngubah ndheke kapan sithik kanggo ngerasakno nyong iki. We method automatically expanded the data available for tutorial by (i) generated new text samples supported on replaced special value by Alter one from the same category, (i i) generated new text samples supported on GNU-2, and (i ii) proposal an automatically method for joining the new text samples with data samples. Sampeyan anyir teks iso nglanggar nggambar luwih dumadhi iki dadi triyang, awak dhéwé wis nguasai perusahaan seneng galaksi, bisa nguasai kang dianggap dhéwé sampeyan data sing bisa nguasai ora bisa metiné surat sitik nggawe nguasai bisa metiné (dan sampeyan teks iso ngrebut in é from data). Nang sampeyan é2E lan webNLG bench-alam iki, kita ngomong nik wektu nggawe barang-barang manut karo perbudhakan maneh iso nggawe nguasai model sing wis nguasai nêmêr, dadi 10% kebutuhan karo akeh lanian. Ngawe ngubah gambar data yang ditambalo, modelo sing iso nggawe seneng padha sekènatis-to-sekènatis maneh sing wis dianggo seneng mpungang 5 B luwih (sing dibenalke perusahaan kartané)', 'sk': 'Pri številnih novih področjih uporabe za generiranje podatkov v besedilo je glavna ovira pri usposabljanju nevronskih modelov pomanjkanje podatkov o usposabljanju. Medtem ko je običajno na strani podatkov na voljo veliko število primerov, je pogosto na voljo le zelo malo vzorcev besedila. Za reševanje tega problema tukaj predlagamo nov pristop za nekaj posnetkov za to okolje. Naš pristop samodejno povečuje razpoložljive podatke za usposabljanje z (i) ustvarjanjem novih vzorcev besedila, ki temeljijo na zamenjavi določenih vrednosti z alternativnimi vrednostmi iz iste kategorije, (ii) ustvarjanjem novih vzorcev besedila na podlagi GPT-2 in (iii) predlaganjem avtomatske metode za združevanje novih vzorcev besedila z vzorci podatkov. Ker lahko povečanje besedila vnese hrup v podatke o usposabljanju, uporabljamo kot cilj doslednost cikla, da bi zagotovili pravilno rekonstruiranje določenega podatkovnega vzorca po oblikovanju besedila (in rekonstruiranje besedilnih vzorcev iz podatkov). Na referenčnih vrednostih E2E in WebNLG kažemo, da je ta šibko nadzorovana paradigma usposabljanja sposobna preseči popolnoma nadzorovane modele zaporedja do zaporedja z manj kot 10% nabora usposabljanj. Z uporabo vseh označenih podatkov lahko naš model poveča učinkovitost standardnega modela od zaporedja do zaporedja za več kot 5 točk BLEU in vzpostavi nov najsodobnejši na obeh naborih podatkov.', 'he': 'למשך שטחי שימוש חדשים רבים לדור מידע לטקסט, המכשול הראשי באימון מודלים עצביים מורכב מחסר מידע אימון. בעוד בדרך כלל מספר גדול של מקרים זמינים בצד הנתונים, לעתים קרובות יש רק מעט דגימות טקסט זמינות. כדי להתמודד עם הבעיה הזאת, אנו כאן מציעים גישה חדשה של כמה צילומים לתוכנית הזאת. הגישה שלנו מגדילה באופן אוטומטי את הנתונים הנוכחים לאימון על ידי (i) לייצר דגימות טקסט חדשות מבוססות על החלפת ערכים ספציפיים על ידי ערכים אלטרנטיביים מאותה קטגוריה, (ii) לייצר דגימות טקסט חדשות מבוססות על GPT-2, ולiii) להציע שיטה אוטומטית לזוג ד As the text augmentation can introduce noise to the training data, we use cycle consistency as an objective, in order to make sure that a given data sample can be correctly reconstructed after having been formulated as text (and that text samples can be reconstructed from data).  בנקודות הרווחים E2E וגם WebNLG, אנו מראים שהפרדיגמה הזאת של אימון שמבוטחת בחולשה מסוגלת לעבור על מודלים רצף-רצף שמבוטחים לחלוטין עם פחות מ-10 אחוזים מהתכנית. על ידי השימוש בכל הנתונים המכתבים, המודל שלנו יכול לגביר את ההפעלה של מודל סטנדרטי רצף לרצף על ידי יותר מ-5 נקודות BLEU, להקים מצב חדש של המידע על שני קבוצות נתונים.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis A lokacin da aka ƙulla manyan shiryoyin ayuka masu girma a kan sunan bayan data, ko da yawa ana iya sãmun misãlai kaɗan kawai. Domin da za mu yi amfani da wannan mataimaki, don mu buƙata wani matsayi mai sauya zuwa wannan daidaita. Tsarakanmu na gaskata data ɗin da ke iya amfani da wa wa'anar da (i) ya ƙara samfani na matsayi na yanzu a kan musanya kima masu ƙayyade daga categori, (ii) ya ƙãga misãlai masu motsi na matsayi a kan GPT-2, da (IIi) ya buɗe wata hanyoyi farat ɗaya ga ya haɗi misãlai na rubutu da misãlai na data. Kama da tabbatarwa na littãfi za'a iya ƙara sauni ga data na amfani da shi, sai mu yi amfani da cylla mai daidai kamar abun, dõmin a tabbatar da cewa an canza misali da aka bai wa zaluman bayan an ƙiƙira shi kamar matsayi (kuma an canza misalin misãlai na rubutu daga data). Daga duk bangon E2U da WebNLG, munã nuna cewa wannan paradigm wanda aka tsare mai rauni ya iya iya iya iya cikakken sura misalin-dubi'in-sequence da ƙari daga 10% na daidaita. Yi amfani da duk data da aka sanar da shi, shirinmu yana iya ƙaranci game da shirin wata motsi na daban-sakan da ke ƙara pointi 5 BLEU, kuma yana sami wani halin-sanar-da-biyu kan daidaita zalumai biyu.", 'bo': 'ཉེར་སྤྱོད་གསར་བ་མང་ཙམ་ལ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡིག སྤྱིར་བཏང་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་དཔེ་བརྗོད་ཆེ་ཆུང་ལ་གནས་སྐྱོད་རུང་བའི་ཚད་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་ནའང་ཡིག་གི་དཔེ་བརྗོད་དག་ དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལ་བཤད་ན་ང་ཚོས་དེ་གིས་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཉུང་བའི་གོ་སྐབས་བཤད་བྱས་ཡོད། Our approach automatically augments the data available for training by (i) generating new text samples based on replacing specific values by alternatives ones from the same category, (ii) generating new text samples based on GPT-2, and (iii) proposing an automatic method for pairing the new text samples with data samples. As the text augmentation can introduce noise to the training data, we use cycle consistency as an objective, in order to make sure that a given data sample can be correctly reconstructed after having been formulated as text (and that text samples can be reconstructed from data). E2E དང་WebNLG ལས་ཀ་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་དཔྱད་ཚད་གཉིས་ལས་ངེད་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཐོང་ནི་འོང་བའི་རྟོན་པའི་དབྱིབས་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་གི་མི་མཐོང་སྣེ་མང་བྱེད་པའི་རྣམ་པ་གྲངས་བསྡ ང་ཚོའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་འདིས་སྤྱོད་པའི་དབྱིབས་གྱིས་ཚད་རིམ་པ་ལྟར་འགྱུར་བ་ཅིན་གྱི་དབྱིབས་སྔར་བ་དང་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཡར་བསྐྱེད་ཐབས་ཤ'}
{'en': 'Self-Training Pre-Trained Language Models for Zero- and Few-Shot Multi-Dialectal Arabic Sequence Labeling', 'ar': 'نماذج لغوية ذاتية التدريب مُدرَّبة مسبقًا لتصنيف التسلسل العربي متعدد اللهجات الصفري والقليل من اللقطات', 'es': 'Modelos lingüísticos preentrenados de autoaprendizaje para el etiquetado multidialectal de secuencias árabes de cero y pocos disparos', 'fr': "Modèles linguistiques pré-entraînés par auto-apprentissage pour l'étiquetage de séquences arabes multidialectales à zéro et à faible dose", 'pt': 'Modelos de linguagem pré-treinados de autotreinamento para rotulagem de sequência árabe multidialetal de zero e poucos disparos', 'ja': 'ゼロおよびほとんどショットの多方言アラビア語シーケンスラベリングのためのセルフトレーニング事前トレーニング言語モデル', 'zh': '用零和少镜头多方言阿拉伯语序标记者自练言语模样', 'ru': 'Самообучающиеся предварительно обученные языковые модели для многодиалектной арабской маркировки последовательностей с нулевым и малым выстрелом', 'hi': 'शून्य के लिए स्व-प्रशिक्षण पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल- और कुछ-शॉट मल्टी-बोलचाल अरबी अनुक्रम लेबलिंग', 'ga': 'Múnlaí Teanga Réamhoilte Féin-Oiliúna le haghaidh Lipéadú Seicheamh Araibis Ilchanánach Nialasach agus Beagán', 'hu': 'Önképző előképzett nyelvi modellek nulla- és kevés lövéses többdialektális arab szekvencia címkézéshez', 'el': 'Αυτο-κατάρτιση προ-εκπαιδευμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα για μηδενική και λίγος-πυροβολισμός πολυ-διαλεκτική αραβική επισήμανση ακολουθίας', 'ka': 'თავისუფლიო განაკეთებული წავლის მოდელები ნულ- და ცოტა- სუფლიო მრავალური დიალექტური აპაბიური განაკეთებული წავლის მართლად', 'lt': 'Savitarpio mokymo išankstinis kalbos modelis, skirtas nuliniam ir nedideliam kelių nuotraukų arabų sekos ženklinimui', 'mk': 'Self-Training Pre-Trained Language Models for Zero- and Few-Shot Multi-Dialectal Arabic Sequence Labeling', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Mudelli ta’ Lingwa Mħarrġa minn Qabel ta’ Taħriġ Awtomatiku għal Tikkettar tas-Sekwenza Għarbija Multidijalettika Żero u Żgħar', 'kk': 'Өзіңіздің оқыту алдын- оқыту тіл үлгілері нөл- және кіші- диалектикалық араб тілдерінің көп- диалектикалық қадамдастыру үлгілері', 'ml': 'സ്വയം പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d', 'it': "Modelli linguistici pre-addestrati per l'etichettatura di sequenze arabe multi-dialettali zero e pochi colpi", 'ro': 'Modele lingvistice pre-instruite pentru etichetarea secvențelor arabe multidialecte zero și puține fotografii', 'mn': 'Өөрийгөө дасгал хөгжлийн өмнө дасгал хөгжлийн хэл загварууд нь Нөлөө, Бага зэрэг дасгал Араб дасгал дасгал', 'si': 'සීරෝ සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ස්වයං ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරධානය කළ භාෂා මොඩේල්', 'no': 'Sjølvøvingsføreøvingsspråk- modeller for null- og få- skytt fleire- dialektiske arabiske sekvensmerkelapp', 'sv': 'Självträning Förtränade språkmodeller för noll- och få-skott multidialektisk arabisk sekvensmärkning', 'ta': 'சூழ்நிலை', 'ur': 'صفر اور تھوڑی سیٹ Multi-Dialectal عربی سکوئنس لابلینگ کے لئے خود تربین کی پیش تربین کی زبان موڈل', 'sr': 'Samouvježbeni predobučeni jezički modeli za označavanje nuklearnog i manjog višedijalektnog arapskog sekvencije', 'pl': 'Wstępnie przeszkolone modele językowe dla zerowego i niewielkiego wielokdialektalnego znakowania sekwencji arabskiej', 'so': 'Qoraalka afka hore ee iskaa-waxbarashada ee Zero- iyo few-Shot Multi-Dialectal Arabic Sequence Labeling', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chế độ Ngôn ngữ Tự Đào tạo Trước-Huấn luyện Tự Đào tạo cho Hiệu ứng đa- và Vài cú- Quay Nhiều- Quay', 'bg': 'Предварително обучени езикови модели за нулево и малко снимки многодиалектално арабско последователно етикетиране', 'hr': 'Samouvježbeni predobučeni jezički modeli za označavanje višedijalektnih arapskih sekvencija nuklearnih i manjih pucnjava', 'da': 'Selvtræning Pre-trænede sprogmodeller til nul- og få-skud multi-dialektisk arabisk sekvensmærkning', 'nl': 'Self-Training Vooropgeleide Taalmodellen voor Zero- en Few-Shot Multi-Dialectale Arabische Sequence Labeling', 'de': 'Selbstausbildende Vortrainierte Sprachmodelle für Zero- und Few-Shot Multi-Dialektale arabische Sequenz Beschriftung', 'ko': '영포와 소포 다방언 아랍어 서열 표기된 자훈련 예훈련 언어 모형', 'id': 'Model Bahasa Latihan-Berdiri untuk Label Sekuensi Arab Multi-Dialektik Zero- dan Few-Shot', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای زبان پیش\u200cآموزش خودآموزش برای برچسب\u200cهای مجموعه\u200cی صفر- و چندگانه\u200cی ضربه\u200cهای مجموعه\u200cی دیالکتریک عربی', 'sw': 'Kujifunza kujifunza kwa Kiarabu Kufuatilia Kiarabu', 'tr': 'Öz-bellenen Öňki Ewez Edilmeleri', 'af': 'Selfoerwinning voor- oerwinning Taal Modelle vir Zero- en Fei- Shot Multi- Dialekteel Arabiese Sekvens Labeling', 'sq': 'Modelet e gjuhës së stërvitur në mënyrë të parastërvitur për etiketën e pasojave arabe shumëdialektale zero- dhe pak-shtëna', 'am': 'Self-Training Pre-Trained Language Models for Zero- and Few-Shot Multi-Dialectal Arabic Sequence Labeling', 'hy': 'Ինքնավարժեցման նախավարժեցված լեզվի մոդելներ զրո- և քիչ-կրակի բազմա-դիալեկտալ արաբական հաջորդականության նշանների համար', 'az': '칐z t톛hsil 칐n-t톛hsil 칐n-t톛hsil Dili Modell톛ri S캼f캼r-v톛 Biraz Diyalektal Arab S캼radan Etilm톛si 칲칞칲n', 'bn': 'জিরো- এবং কয়েকটি শটের প্রশিক্ষণের পূর্ববর্তী ভাষা মোডেলের জন্য', 'bs': 'Samouvježbački predobučeni jezički modeli za označavanje višedijalektne sekvence arapskih nuklearnih i manjih pucnjava', 'ca': "Models de llenguatge pré-entrenat d'autoformació per etiquetar la seqüència àrab multidialectal zero i poc disparat", 'cs': 'Předškolené jazykové modely pro nulové a několik záběrů multidialektální arabské sekvence popisování', 'fi': 'Itseharjoittelu Esikoulutetut kielimallit nolla- ja muutaman laukauksen monivalintaiseen arabian sekvenssimerkintöön', 'et': 'Enesekoolituse eelõpetatud keelemudelid null- ja vähevahelise mitmedialektilise araabia järjestuse märgistamiseks', 'jv': 'Nambah-Ngenyangno layang Tulung-Ngenyangno Pasang kanggo 0 - lan Few-shot Multi-diaelectal al al Gambar Seyene Label', 'sk': 'Predurjeni jezikovni modeli za označevanje zaporedja arabščine z ničelnim in nekaj slikami', 'he': 'Self-Training Pre-Trained Language Models for Zero- and Few-Shot Multi-Dialectal Arabic Sequence Labeling', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Self-Training Pre-Trained Language Models for Zero- and Few-Shot Multi-Dialectal Arabic Sequence Labeling'}
{'en': 'A sufficient amount of annotated data is usually required to fine-tune pre-trained language models for downstream tasks. Unfortunately, attaining labeled data can be costly, especially for multiple language varieties and dialects. We propose to self-train pre-trained language models in zero- and few-shot scenarios to improve performance on data-scarce varieties using only resources from data-rich ones. We demonstrate the utility of our approach in the context of Arabic sequence labeling by using a language model fine-tuned on Modern Standard Arabic (MSA) only to predict named entities (NE) and part-of-speech (POS) tags on several dialectal Arabic (DA) varieties. We show that self-training is indeed powerful, improving zero-shot MSA-to-DA transfer by as large as 10 % F_1 (NER) and 2 % accuracy (POS tagging). We acquire even better performance in few-shot scenarios with limited amounts of labeled data. We conduct an ablation study and show that the performance boost observed directly results from training data augmentation possible with DA examples via self-training. This opens up opportunities for developing DA models exploiting only MSA resources. Our approach can also be extended to other languages and tasks._1 (NER) and 2% accuracy (POS tagging). We acquire even better performance in few-shot scenarios with limited amounts of labeled data. We conduct an ablation study and show that the performance boost observed directly results from training data augmentation possible with DA examples via self-training. This opens up opportunities for developing DA models exploiting only MSA resources. Our approach can also be extended to other languages and tasks.', 'ar': 'عادة ما تكون هناك حاجة إلى كمية كافية من البيانات المشروحة لضبط نماذج اللغة المدربة مسبقًا للمهام النهائية. لسوء الحظ ، يمكن أن يكون الحصول على البيانات المصنفة مكلفًا ، خاصةً بالنسبة للغات ولهجات متعددة. نقترح التدريب الذاتي لنماذج اللغة المدربة مسبقًا في سيناريوهات قليلة وقليلة اللقطة لتحسين الأداء في الأنواع النادرة البيانات باستخدام موارد فقط من الأنواع الغنية بالبيانات. نبرهن على فائدة منهجنا في سياق وضع العلامات على التسلسل العربي باستخدام نموذج لغوي مضبوط بدقة على اللغة العربية الفصحى الحديثة (MSA) فقط للتنبؤ بالكيانات المسماة (NE) وعلامات جزء من الكلام (POS) على العديد من اللهجات. أصناف عربية (DA). نظهر أن التدريب الذاتي قوي حقًا ، حيث يعمل على تحسين نقل MSA-to-DA بدون طلقة بنسبة كبيرة تصل إلى ˷10٪ F_1 (NER) ودقة 2٪ (علامات POS). نحصل على أداء أفضل في سيناريوهات قليلة اللقطات بكميات محدودة من البيانات المصنفة. نجري دراسة الاجتثاث ونوضح أن تعزيز الأداء الملحوظ ينتج بشكل مباشر من زيادة بيانات التدريب الممكنة باستخدام أمثلة DA عبر التدريب الذاتي. هذا يفتح الفرص لتطوير نماذج DA باستغلال موارد MSA فقط. يمكن أيضًا توسيع نهجنا ليشمل لغات ومهام أخرى.', 'pt': 'Geralmente, é necessária uma quantidade suficiente de dados anotados para ajustar modelos de linguagem pré-treinados para tarefas de downstream. Infelizmente, obter dados rotulados pode ser caro, especialmente para várias variedades de idiomas e dialetos. Propomos o autotreinamento de modelos de linguagem pré-treinados em cenários de zero e poucos tiros para melhorar o desempenho em variedades de dados escassos usando apenas recursos de ricos em dados. Demonstramos a utilidade de nossa abordagem no contexto de rotulagem de sequência em árabe usando um modelo de linguagem ajustado em árabe padrão moderno (MSA) apenas para prever entidades nomeadas (NE) e tags de parte da fala (POS) em vários idiomas dialetais Variedades árabes (DA). Mostramos que o autotreinamento é realmente poderoso, melhorando a transferência zero-shot de MSA para DA em até ˷10% F_1 (NER) e 2% de precisão (marcação POS). Adquirimos um desempenho ainda melhor em cenários de poucas fotos com quantidades limitadas de dados rotulados. Conduzimos um estudo de ablação e mostramos que o aumento de desempenho observado resulta diretamente do aumento de dados de treinamento possível com exemplos de DA via autotreinamento. Isso abre oportunidades para o desenvolvimento de modelos de DA explorando apenas recursos MSA. Nossa abordagem também pode ser estendida a outras linguagens e tarefas.', 'es': 'Por lo general, se requiere una cantidad suficiente de datos anotados para ajustar los modelos de lenguaje previamente entrenados para las tareas posteriores. Desafortunadamente, obtener datos etiquetados puede resultar costoso, especialmente para diversas variedades de idiomas y dialectos. Proponemos autoentrenar modelos de lenguaje preentrenados en escenarios de cero y pocos disparos para mejorar el rendimiento en variedades con escasez de datos utilizando solo recursos de fuentes ricas en datos. Demostramos la utilidad de nuestro enfoque en el contexto del etiquetado de secuencias en árabe mediante el uso de un modelo de lenguaje afinado en árabe estándar moderno (MSA) solo para predecir etiquetas de entidades nombradas (NE) y de parte del habla (POS) en varias variedades de árabe dialectal (DA). Demostramos que el autoentrenamiento es realmente poderoso, ya que mejora la transferencia cero de MSA a DA en hasta un 10% de F_1 (NER) y un 2% de precisión (etiquetado POS). Adquirimos un rendimiento aún mejor en escenarios de pocos disparos con cantidades limitadas de datos etiquetados. Llevamos a cabo un estudio de ablación y demostramos que el aumento del rendimiento observado directamente es el resultado del aumento de los datos de entrenamiento posible con ejemplos de DA a través del autoentrenamiento. Esto abre oportunidades para desarrollar modelos de DA que explotan solo los recursos de MSA. Nuestro enfoque también se puede extender a otros idiomas y tareas.', 'fr': "Une quantité suffisante de données annotées est généralement requise pour affiner les modèles linguistiques pré-entraînés pour les tâches en aval. Malheureusement, l'obtention de données étiquetées peut s'avérer coûteuse, en particulier pour de multiples variétés de langues et dialectes. Nous proposons d'auto-entraîner des modèles de langage pré-entraînés dans des scénarios zéro et peu nombreux afin d'améliorer les performances sur des variétés rares en données en utilisant uniquement des ressources provenant de sources riches en données. Nous démontrons l'utilité de notre approche dans le contexte de l'étiquetage des séquences arabes en utilisant un modèle de langage affiné sur l'arabe standard moderne (MSA) uniquement pour prédire les entités nommées (NE) et les balises de partie du discours (POS) sur plusieurs variétés d'arabe dialectal (DA). Nous montrons que l'auto-apprentissage est en effet puissant, améliorant le transfert MSA-DA à zéro coup de 10\xa0% F_1 (NER) et 2\xa0% de précision (marquage POS). Nous obtenons des performances encore meilleures dans des scénarios peu nombreux avec des quantités limitées de données étiquetées. Nous menons une étude d'ablation et montrons que l'augmentation de performance observée résulte directement de l'augmentation des données d'entraînement possible avec des exemples de DA via l'auto-entraînement. Cela ouvre la possibilité de développer des modèles DA exploitant uniquement les ressources MSA. Notre approche peut également être étendue à d'autres langues et tâches.", 'ja': '通常、下流タスクのために事前にトレーニングされた言語モデルを微調整するためには、十分な量の注釈付きデータが必要です。 残念ながら、ラベル付けされたデータを取得するには、特に複数の言語の品種と方言にとってコストがかかる可能性があります。 データの豊富なものからのリソースのみを使用して、データに乏しい品種のパフォーマンスを向上させるために、事前に訓練された言語モデルをゼロショットおよび数ショットシナリオで自己訓練することを提案します。 私たちは、現代標準アラビア語（ MSA ）で微調整された言語モデルを使用して、いくつかの方言アラビア語（ DA ）品種の名前付きエンティティ（ NE ）および音声部分（ POS ）タグを予測することによって、アラビア語配列ラベル付けの文脈における私たちのアプローチの有用性を実証します。 セルフトレーニングは、確かに強力であり、ゼロショットMSA - to - DA転送を最大で、10%のF_1 （ NER ）と2%の精度（ POSタグ付け）を向上させることが示されています。 ラベル付けされたデータの量が限られている数少ないシナリオでは、さらに優れたパフォーマンスを獲得します。 アブレーション試験を実施し、自己訓練によりDA例を用いた訓練データの増強が可能であることから、観察されたパフォーマンスの向上が直接的な結果であることを示した。 これにより、MSAリソースのみを利用してDAモデルを開発する機会が開かれます。 私たちのアプローチは、他の言語やタスクにも拡張できます。', 'zh': '常须足数带注之数以微调下流之预习言语模样。 不幸者,取标数本可高,尤于多种语言变体方言。 臣等请于零、少之间,自练言语,以崇数足之资,以重数稀缺之性。 吾因于今阿拉伯语(MSA)微言以演吾法于阿拉伯语上下文之实用性,唯以占数言阿拉伯语(DA)变体名实(NE)与词性(POS)标。 吾自练诚强,可将零次 MSA 于 DA 者传输崇 10% F_1 (NER)、 2% 之准确率(POS )。 在标数据量有限小镜头场中,我们得到了好性能。 臣等研究,并明观察性能升擢自由DA示例以自练数增强。 这为开仅因 MSA 资议程项目资给。 我们的方法也可以扩到他的话。', 'ru': 'Обычно требуется достаточное количество аннотированных данных для точной настройки предварительно обученных языковых моделей для задач, выполняемых в нисходящем направлении. К сожалению, получение маркированных данных может быть дорогостоящим, особенно для многоязычных разновидностей и диалектов. Мы предлагаем самостоятельно обучать предварительно обученные языковые модели в сценариях с нулевым и малым выстрелом для улучшения производительности по разновидностям, испытывающим нехватку данных, используя только ресурсы из богатых данными. Мы демонстрируем полезность нашего подхода в контексте маркировки арабской последовательности, используя языковую модель, доработанную на современном стандартном арабском языке (MSA), только для прогнозирования именованных сущностей (NE) и тегов части речи (POS) на нескольких диалектных арабских (DA) разновидностях. Мы показываем, что самообучение действительно является мощным, улучшая передачу MSA от MSA к DA с нулевым выстрелом на целых 10% F_1 (NER) и 2% точность (маркировка POS). Мы приобретаем еще лучшую производительность в сценариях с несколькими выстрелами с ограниченными объемами маркированных данных. Мы проводим исследование абляции и показываем, что повышение производительности, наблюдаемое непосредственно, является результатом увеличения данных обучения, которое возможно с помощью примеров DA посредством самообучения. Это открывает возможности для разработки моделей DA с использованием только ресурсов СУО. Наш подход также может быть распространен на другие языки и задачи.', 'hi': 'एनोटेट किए गए डेटा की पर्याप्त मात्रा आमतौर पर डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्यों के लिए पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल को ठीक करने के लिए आवश्यक होती है। दुर्भाग्य से, लेबल किए गए डेटा को प्राप्त करना महंगा हो सकता है, खासकर कई भाषा किस्मों और बोलियों के लिए। हम डेटा-समृद्ध लोगों से केवल संसाधनों का उपयोग करके डेटा-दुर्लभ किस्मों पर प्रदर्शन में सुधार करने के लिए शून्य- और कुछ-शॉट परिदृश्यों में पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल को स्व-प्रशिक्षित करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम अरबी अनुक्रम लेबलिंग के संदर्भ में हमारे दृष्टिकोण की उपयोगिता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं, जो आधुनिक मानक अरबी (एमएसए) पर एक भाषा मॉडल का उपयोग करके केवल नामित संस्थाओं (एनई) और पार्ट-ऑफ-स्पीच (पीओएस) टैग की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए कई बोलचाल अरबी (डीए) किस्मों पर है। हम दिखाते हैं कि आत्म-प्रशिक्षण वास्तव में शक्तिशाली है, शून्य-शॉट एमएसए-टू-डीए हस्तांतरण में सुधार करते हुए 10% F_1 (एनईआर) और 2% सटीकता (पीओएस टैगिंग) के रूप में बड़े पैमाने पर। हम लेबल किए गए डेटा की सीमित मात्रा के साथ कुछ-शॉट परिदृश्यों में भी बेहतर प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करते हैं। हम एक एब्लेशन अध्ययन का संचालन करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि प्रदर्शन को बढ़ावा देने के लिए आत्म-प्रशिक्षण के माध्यम से डीए उदाहरणों के साथ संभव प्रशिक्षण डेटा वृद्धि से सीधे परिणाम देखे गए हैं। यह केवल एमएसए संसाधनों का शोषण करने वाले डीए मॉडल विकसित करने के अवसरों को खोलता है। हमारे दृष्टिकोण को अन्य भाषाओं और कार्यों तक भी बढ़ाया जा सकता है।', 'ga': 'Is gnách go mbíonn gá le méid leordhóthanach sonraí anótáilte chun mionchoigeartú a dhéanamh ar mhúnlaí teanga réamhoilte le haghaidh tascanna iartheachtacha. Ar an drochuair, is féidir leis a bheith costasach sonraí lipéadaithe a bhaint amach, go háirithe i gcás cineálacha agus canúintí iolracha. Tá sé i gceist againn féin-oiliúint a chur ar mhúnlaí teanga réamhoilte i gcásanna náid agus fíorbheagán d’fhonn feidhmíocht a fheabhsú ar chineálacha atá gann ar shonraí agus úsáid á baint as acmhainní ó shaibhir sonraí amháin. Léirímid úsáideacht ár gcur chuige i gcomhthéacs lipéadú seicheamh Araibis trí úsáid a bhaint as samhail teanga arna mionchoigeartú ar Araibis Chaighdeánach Nua-Aimseartha (MSA) ach amháin chun aonáin ainmnithe (NE) agus clibeanna cuid de chaint (POS) a thuar ar roinnt canúintí. Cineálacha Araibis (DA). Léiríonn muid go bhfuil féin-oiliúint cumhachtach go deimhin, ag feabhsú aistriú MSA-go-DA náid-lámhaigh chomh mór le ˷10% F_1 (NER) agus cruinneas 2% (clibeáil POS). Faighimid feidhmíocht níos fearr fós i gcásanna cúpla lámhaigh le méideanna teoranta de shonraí lipéadaithe. Déanaimid staidéar eisiblithe agus léirímid go dtagann an treisiú feidhmíochta a breathnaíodh go díreach ar mhéadú sonraí oiliúna is féidir le samplaí DA trí fhéinoiliúint. Cruthaíonn sé seo deiseanna chun samhlacha LM a fhorbairt ag baint leasa as acmhainní MSA amháin. Is féidir ár gcur chuige a leathnú chuig teangacha agus tascanna eile freisin.', 'hu': 'Általában elegendő mennyiségű jegyzetelt adatra van szükség az előre képzett nyelvi modellek finomhangolásához a downstream feladatokhoz. Sajnos a címkézett adatok elérése költséges lehet, különösen többféle nyelvváltozat és dialektus esetében. Javasoljuk, hogy az előre képzett nyelvi modellek önképzését zéró és kevés lövéses forgatókönyvekben javítsuk az adatszűkös fajták teljesítményének javítása érdekében, kizárólag adatban gazdag fajtákból származó erőforrások felhasználásával. Megközelítésünk hasznosságát az arab szekvencia címkézéssel összefüggésben egy modern szabványos arab (MSA) nyelven finomhangolt nyelvmodell segítségével demonstráljuk, csak a névleges entitások (NE) és a beszédrész (POS) címkék előrejelzésére számos dialektális arab (DA) fajtán. Megmutatjuk, hogy az önképzés valóban erőteljes, javítva a nulla lövés MSA-DA átvitelt akár 10%-kal F_1 (NER) és 2%-os pontossággal (POS címkézés). Még jobb teljesítményt érünk el néhány felvételi forgatókönyvben, korlátozott mennyiségű címkézett adattal. Ablációs tanulmányt végzünk, és kimutatjuk, hogy a megfigyelt teljesítménynövekedés közvetlenül az edzési adatok növeléséből ered, amelyeket DA példákkal lehetséges önképzésen keresztül. Ez lehetőségeket nyit a kizárólag MSA erőforrásokat kihasználó DA modellek fejlesztésére. Megközelítésünk más nyelvekre és feladatokra is kiterjeszthető.', 'el': 'Συνήθως απαιτείται επαρκής αριθμός σχολιασμένων δεδομένων για την τελειοποίηση των προ-εκπαιδευμένων γλωσσικών μοντέλων για μεταγενέστερες εργασίες. Δυστυχώς, η απόκτηση δεδομένων με ετικέτα μπορεί να είναι δαπανηρή, ειδικά για πολλαπλές γλωσσικές ποικιλίες και διαλέκτους. Προτείνουμε να αυτοεκπαιδεύσουμε προ-εκπαιδευμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα σε σενάρια μηδενικής και ελάχιστης λήψης για να βελτιώσουμε την απόδοση σε ποικιλίες σπάνιων δεδομένων χρησιμοποιώντας μόνο πόρους από πλούσιες σε δεδομένα. Επιδεικνύουμε τη χρησιμότητα της προσέγγισής μας στο πλαίσιο της επισήμανσης αραβικών ακολουθιών χρησιμοποιώντας ένα γλωσσικό μοντέλο που είναι συντονισμένο στα σύγχρονα τυποποιημένα αραβικά (MSA) μόνο για να προβλέψουμε ονομαστικές οντότητες (NE) και ετικέτες τμήματος ομιλίας (POS) σε διάφορες διαλεκτικές αραβικές (DA) ποικιλίες. Δείχνουμε ότι η αυτοεκπαίδευση είναι πράγματι ισχυρή, βελτιώνοντας τη μεταφορά μηδενικής βολής MSA-σε-DA κατά 10% F_1 (NER) και 2% ακρίβεια (POS tagging). Αποκλείουμε ακόμα καλύτερη απόδοση σε σενάρια ελάχιστων πυροβολισμών με περιορισμένες ποσότητες ετικετών δεδομένων. Διεξάγουμε μια μελέτη αφαίρεσης και καταδεικνύουμε ότι η αύξηση της απόδοσης που παρατηρείται άμεσα προκύπτει από την αύξηση των δεδομένων κατάρτισης που είναι δυνατή με παραδείγματα μέσω αυτοκατάρτισης. Αυτό ανοίγει ευκαιρίες για την ανάπτυξη μοντέλων DA που εκμεταλλεύονται μόνο πόρους MSA. Η προσέγγισή μας μπορεί επίσης να επεκταθεί σε άλλες γλώσσες και καθήκοντα.', 'ka': 'ჩამოტვირთებული მონაცემები უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, რომლებიც უნდა დააკეთება წინატვირთებული ენის მოდელების შესახებ. მართლად, მართლური მონაცემების მიღება შეიძლება იყოს ძალიან ძალიან, განსაკუთრებით რამდენიმე ენის განსხვავებებით და დიალეკტებისთვის. ჩვენ გვეძლევა თავისუფლებად გავაგრძნოთ წავლის მოდელეები ნულ- და რამდენიმე სენარიოში, რომლებიც მონაცემების განსხვავებაში უფრო მეტადება მონაცემების განსხვავებაში,  ჩვენ ჩვენი პროგრამის სრულობის გამოყენება აპაბიური წერტილის კონტექსექსექსექსექსექსების კონტექსტში გამოყენებული ენახური მოდელის გამოყენებით მხოლოდ მოდინარებული აპაბიური (MSA) მხოლოდ გამოყენებთ სახელ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ თავისტრენცია ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან, საუკეთესო სტრინცია MSA-დან-DA-დან გაუქმება, როგორც 10% F_1 (NER) და 2% სიმართლე (POS-ნიშნცია). ჩვენ უფრო უკეთესი გავაკეთებთ რამდენიმე სენარიოში, რომლებიც უფრო უკეთესი მონაცემები დავწერა. ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ წარმოდგენის სწავლა და ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ წარმოდგენება გააკეთებულია პირდაპირად გააკეთებული მონაცემების გააკეთებაზე შესაძლებელია დააკეთ ეს გახსნა შესაძლებლობა მხოლოდ MSA რესურსების განვითარებისთვის მოდელების განვითარებისთვის. ჩვენი დახმარება შეიძლება ასევე გადაფართვალად სხვა ენებით და დავალებებით.', 'mk': 'Доволна количина анотирани податоци обично се потребни за финетизирање на предобучените јазички модели за понатамошни задачи. Unfortunately, attaining labeled data can be costly, especially for multiple language varieties and dialects.  Ние предлагаме самообука на предобучени јазички модели во нула- и неколку-снимки сценарија за подобрување на резултатите на различностите со недостаток на податоци користејќи само ресурси од оние богати со податоци. Ние ја демонстрираме корисноста на нашиот пристап во контекст на арапската секвенца на етикетирање со користење на јазички модел фино прилагоден на модерниот стандарден арапски (MSA) само за да предвидеме именувани ентитети (NE) и дел од говорот (POS) на неколку дијалектални арапски (DA) разнови. We show that self-training is indeed powerful, improving zero-shot MSA-to-DA transfer by as large as  10% F_1 (NER) and 2% accuracy (POS tagging).  Добиваме уште подобри резултати во неколку сценарија со ограничени количини на обележани податоци. Правиме аплациска студија и покажуваме дека зголемувањето на резултатите директно ги набљудувавме резултатите од зголемувањето на податоците за обука можно со примери од обвинителството преку самообука. Ова отвора можности за развој на модели на обвинителството кои ги искористуваат само ресурсите на МСА. Нашиот пристап може да се прошири и на други јазици и задачи.', 'it': "Di solito è necessaria una quantità sufficiente di dati annotati per ottimizzare i modelli linguistici pre-addestrati per le attività a valle. Purtroppo, ottenere dati etichettati può essere costoso, soprattutto per varietà linguistiche e dialetti multipli. Proponiamo di auto-formare modelli linguistici pre-addestrati in scenari zero e pochi scatti per migliorare le prestazioni sulle varietà scarse di dati utilizzando solo risorse provenienti da quelli ricchi di dati. Dimostriamo l'utilità del nostro approccio nel contesto dell'etichettatura della sequenza araba utilizzando un modello linguistico perfezionato sull'arabo standard moderno (MSA) solo per predire entità nominate (NE) e tag part-of-speech (POS) su diverse varietà dialettali arabe (DA). Dimostriamo che l'auto-allenamento è davvero potente, migliorando il trasferimento MSA-to-DA zero fino al 10% F_1 (NER) e al 2% di precisione (POS tagging). Otteniamo prestazioni ancora migliori in scenari a pochi scatti con quantità limitate di dati etichettati. Conduciamo uno studio di ablazione e mostriamo che il miglioramento delle prestazioni osservato deriva direttamente dall'aumento dei dati di allenamento possibile con esempi DA tramite auto-allenamento. Questo apre opportunità per lo sviluppo di modelli DA che sfruttano solo le risorse MSA. Il nostro approccio può essere esteso anche ad altre lingue e compiti.", 'kk': 'Төменгі тапсырмалар үшін алдын- оқылған тіл үлгілерін баптау үшін қажетті мәліметтер керек. Кешіріңіз, жарлықталған деректерді жеткізу үшін күнделікті болуы мүмкін, осылай қатар тіл түрлері мен диалекттер үшін. Біз өзіміздің алдын- оқылған тіл үлгілерін нөл және бірнеше сценариясында өзіміздің өзіміздің өзіміздің өзіміздің өзіміздің өзіміздің өзіміздің өзіміз Біз Араб ретіндегі жарлықтың утилитасын тек көптеген әртүрлі араб стандартты (MSA) тіл үлгісін қолдану үшін тек аталған нысандарды (NE) және сөйлеу (POS) бөлігін бірнеше диалекталық араб (DA) тегтерінде көрсету үшін көрсетеді. Біз өзіміздің оқытуымыз қуатты деп көрсетедік. Жергілікті MSA-мен-DA транспорттауын 10% F_1 (NER) және 2% дұрыс (POS- тегтері) деп үлкен жасау үшін. Біз кейбір сценарияларда шектелген мәліметтердің шектелген мәліметтері бар жақсы жұмыс істеміз. Біз жұмыс істеу зерттеулерін жұмыс істеп, өзімізді оқыту арқылы дұрыс бақылау деректерінің көптегендігін көрсетуге болады. Бұл тек MSA ресурстарын қолдану үлгілерін жасау мүмкіндіктерін ашады. Басқа тілдерге және тапсырмаларга қосылмай алады.', 'ml': 'ഡെസ്ട്രീമിന്റെ ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് മുമ്പ് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് സാധാരണ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നല്ലതാക്കേണ്ടതിനാ നിര്\u200dഭാഗ്യവശാല്\u200d, ലേബല്\u200d ചെയ്ത വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നത് വില വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വിലയായിരിക്കാം വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും കുറച്ച് വെടിയുണ്ടാക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളില്\u200d സ്വയം പരിശീലിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. ഡേറ്റായി അറബിക്ക് സംവിധാനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്രോഗത്തിന്റെ ഉപയോഗം കാണിക്കുന്നു. അധികാരത്തിലെ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷയുടെ മോഡല്\u200d മാത്രം മാത്രം മാറ്റിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ആദ്യഭാഷയുടെ സ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d  സ്വയം പരിശീലിക്കുന്നത് ശരിക്കും ശക്തിയാണെന്ന് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. പൂജ്യത്തിലേക്ക് വെടിവെക്കപ്പെട്ട എസ്എംഎസ്-ഡി മാറ്റുന്നത്  കുറച്ച് വെടിവെക്കപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d നല്ല പ്രകടനം നമുക്ക് കിട്ടും. സ്വയം പരിശീലിക്കുന്നതിലൂടെ നേരിട്ട് ഡേറ്റാ കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നേരിട്ട് കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ട് നാം ഒരു  എംഎസ്എ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d മാത്രം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഡി.എ.എ. മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കുന്നതി നമ്മുടെ വഴിയും മറ്റു ഭാഷകളിലും ജോലികളിലും വ്യാപ്തമാക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും.', 'mt': 'Ammont suffiċjenti ta’ dejta annotata normalment huwa meħtieġ biex jiġu rfinuti mudelli lingwistiċi mħarrġa minn qabel għal kompiti downstream. Sfortunatament, il-kisba ta’ dejta ttikkettata tista’ tkun għalja, speċjalment għal varjetajiet u dijaletti multipli ta’ lingwi. We propose to self-train pre-trained language models in zero- and few-shot scenarios to improve performance on data-scarce varieties using only resources from data-rich ones.  Aħna nippruvaw l-utilità tal-approċċ tagħna fil-kuntest tat-tikkettar tas-sekwenza Għarbija billi nużaw mudell lingwistiku rfinut fuq l-Għarbi Standard Modern (MSA) biss biex nipprojbixxu t-tikketti msejħa entitajiet (NE) u parti mid-diskors (POS) fuq diversi varjetajiet dijalettiċi Għarbija (DA). Aħna nuru li t-taħriġ awtonomu huwa tabilħaqq b’saħħtu, u jtejjeb it-trasferiment ta’ MSA b’ċaqliq żero lejn DA b’daqs daqs 10% F_1 (NER) u preċiżjoni ta’ 2% (tikkettar POS). We acquire even better performance in few-shot scenarios with limited amounts of labeled data.  Għandna nagħmlu studju dwar l-ablazzjoni u nuru li t-tisħiħ tal-prestazzjoni osservat direttament jirriżulta minn żieda fid-dejta tat-taħriġ possibbli b’eżempji ta’ DA permezz ta’ taħriġ indipendenti. Dan jiftaħ opportunitajiet għall-iżvilupp ta’ mudelli tad-DA li jisfruttaw biss ir-riżorsi tal-MSA. Our approach can also be extended to other languages and tasks.', 'mn': 'Давхар давхар үйл ажиллагаанд хангалттай хэмжээний өгөгдлийн хэмжээг сайжруулах хэрэгтэй. Харамсалтай нь тэмдэглэгдсэн мэдээллийг хүртэх нь үнэтэй байж болно, ялангуяа олон хэл төрлийн, диалектуудын төлөө. Бид өөрсдийгөө сургалтын өмнө сургалтын хэл загваруудын загваруудыг тэгш болон баян мэдээллийн баян хүмүүсээс зөвхөн хөрөнгө оруулахын тулд өөрсдийгөө сургалтын загваруудыг сургалтын Бид Араб дарааллын дарааллын жагсаалтын тухай арга хэлний загварыг ашиглаж орчин үеийн Араб стандарт (MSA) дээр зөвхөн нэрлэгдсэн загваруудыг (NE) болон олон диалектик Араб (DA) хэлбэрээр тайлбарлах боломжтой арга хэмжээний загваруудыг тайлбар Бид өөртөө суралцах нь үнэхээр хүчтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Нэг шалтгаан нь MSA-д-DA-д 10% F_1 (NER) болон 2% зөв (POS-tagging) шилжүүлж байна. Бид хэд хэдэн зурагтай хувилбарууд дээр ажиллагаа гаргаж байна. Хязгаарлагдсан хэмжээний мэдээллүүд. Бид ажиллагааны судалгаа хийж, үйл ажиллагааны үр дүнг зөвхөн судалгааны өгөгдлийн дасгал өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэлтийн үр дүнг өөрийгөө сургалтын аргаар харуулж байна. Энэ нь зөвхөн MSA боловсролыг ашиглах боломжуудыг нээлттэй. Бидний арга зам нь бас бусад хэл болон үйл ажиллагаанд нэмэгдэж болно.', 'no': 'Det er vanlegvis nødvendig nok mykje notata data for å finne opp før- trenga språk- modeller for nedstrekkoppgåver. Dessverre kan det vere kostna å nå merkelappe data, spesielt for fleire språk variasjonar og dialektar. Vi foreslår å sjølvtraine språk- modeller i null- og få- fotoscenarior for å forbetra utviklinga på datakraftige variasjonar med berre ressursar frå datarike. Vi demonstrerer verktøyet for tilnærminga vårt i konteksten av arabiske sekvensmerkelapp ved å bruka eit språk modell fint opp på moderne arabiske standardmodell (MSA) berre for å foregå dei namne entitetene (NE) og del av tale (POS) på fleire dialektiske arabiske (DA) variasjonar. Vi viser at selvøving er truleg kraftig, forbedring av 0-shot MSA-to-DA-overføring av så stor som 10% F_1 (NER) og 2% nøyaktighet (POS-tagging). Vi får enda bedre utviklingar i få-fotoscenarioar med begrenset mengdar merkelige data. Vi gjer eit aktiveringsstudie og viser at utviklinga blir oppdaga direkte resultat frå opplæringa av data som er mogleg med DA-eksemplar via selvøving. Dette opnar muligheter for å utvikla DA-modeller som berre brukar MSA-ressursar. Tilnærming vårt kan også bli utvida til andre språk og oppgåver.', 'ro': 'De obicei, este necesară o cantitate suficientă de date adnotate pentru a regla modelele lingvistice pre-instruite pentru activitățile din aval. Din păcate, obținerea datelor etichetate poate fi costisitoare, în special pentru mai multe varietăți de limbi și dialecte. Propunem auto-instruirea modelelor lingvistice pre-instruite în scenarii zero și puține împușcături pentru a îmbunătăți performanța varietăților limitate de date utilizând numai resurse din cele bogate în date. Demonstrăm utilitatea abordării noastre în contextul etichetării secvențelor arabe folosind un model de limbă reglat fin pe Araba Standard Modernă (MSA) numai pentru a prezice entitățile denumite (NE) și etichetele part-of-speech (POS) pe mai multe soiuri dialectale arabe (DA). Noi arătăm că auto-antrenamentul este într-adevăr puternic, îmbunătățind transferul MSA-la-DA zero cu până la 10% F_1 (NER) și 2% precizie (etichetare POS). Obținem performanțe și mai bune în scenarii cu câteva fotografii, cu cantități limitate de date etichetate. Realizăm un studiu de ablație și arătăm că creșterea performanței observată rezultă direct din creșterea datelor de antrenament posibilă cu exemple DA prin auto-antrenament. Acest lucru deschide oportunități de dezvoltare a modelelor DA care exploatează numai resursele MSA. Abordarea noastră poate fi extinsă și la alte limbi și sarcini.', 'lt': 'Paprastai reikalingas pakankamas užrašytų duomenų kiekis, kad būtų patobulinti iš anksto parengti kalbų modeliai tolesnėms užduotims atlikti. Deja, ženklintų duomenų gavimas gali būti brangus, ypač daugeliui kalbų veislių ir dialektų. Siūlome savarankiškai treniruoti iš anksto parengtus kalbų modelius nuliniuose ir nedideliuose scenarijuose, kad būtų pagerinti duomenų trūkumo veislių rezultatai, naudojant tik išteklius, gautus iš daug duomenų. We demonstrate the utility of our approach in the context of Arabic sequence labeling by using a language model fine-tuned on Modern Standard Arabic (MSA) only to predict named entities (NE) and part-of-speech (POS) tags on several dialectal Arabic (DA) varieties.  Mes rodome, kad savarankiškas mokymas iš tikrųjų yra galingas, gerinant nulinį MSA perkėlimą į DA tiek, kiek 10 % F_1 (NER) ir 2 % tikslumą (POS ženklinimas). Mes įgyjame dar geresnius rezultatus keliuose scenarijuose su ribotu ženklintų duomenų kiekiu. Atliekame abliacijos tyrimą ir parodome, kad veiksmingumo didinimas buvo tiesiogiai nustatytas mokymo duomenų didinimo rezultatais, įmanoma naudojant DA pavyzdžius per savarankišką mokymą. Tai atveria galimybes kurti DA modelius, naudojančius tik MSA išteklius. Our approach can also be extended to other languages and tasks.', 'pl': 'Wystarczająca ilość adnotacji danych jest zwykle wymagana do dostosowania wstępnie przeszkolonych modeli językowych do dalszych zadań. Niestety uzyskanie danych oznaczonych może być kosztowne, zwłaszcza w przypadku wielu odmian językowych i dialektów. Proponujemy samodzielne szkolenie wstępnie przeszkolonych modeli językowych w scenariuszach zerowych i kilku ujęć, aby poprawić wydajność odmian brakujących danych wykorzystując tylko zasoby z tych bogatych w dane. Wykazujemy użyteczność naszego podejścia w kontekście znakowania sekwencji arabskiej poprzez wykorzystanie modelu językowego dostrojonego na współczesnym standardowym arabskim (MSA) tylko do przewidywania nazwanych jednostek (NE) i znaczników części mowy (POS) na kilku odmianach dialektalnego arabskiego (DA). Pokazujemy, że samotraining jest rzeczywiście potężny, poprawiając zero-shot MSA-to-DA transfer o 10% F_1 (NER) i 2% dokładności (POS tagging). Jeszcze lepszą wydajność uzyskujemy w kilku scenariuszach z ograniczoną ilością etykietowanych danych. Przeprowadzamy badanie ablacji i pokazujemy, że obserwowany wzrost wydajności wynika bezpośrednio z powiększania danych treningowych możliwych przy użyciu przykładów DA poprzez samotraining. Otwiera to możliwości opracowywania modeli DA wykorzystujących jedynie zasoby MSA. Nasze podejście może być również rozszerzone na inne języki i zadania.', 'sr': 'Obično je potrebna dovoljna količina annotiranih podataka za finaliziranje predobučenih jezičkih modela za sledeće zadatke. Nažalost, postizanje označenih podataka može biti skupo, posebno za višestruke jezičke razlike i dijalekte. Predlažemo da se samoupravljamo predobučenim jezičkim modelima u scenarijima nula i nekoliko snimanja da poboljšamo učinkovitost određenih podataka, koristeći samo resurse od bogatih podataka. Pokazujemo korisnost našeg pristupa u kontekstu označavanja arapske sekvence koristeći jezički model fino naveden na modernom standardnom arapskom (MSA) samo da predviđamo imenovane entitate (NE) i dijelogovorne etikete (POS) na nekoliko dijalektnih arapskih razlika (DA). Pokazujemo da je samoupravljenje zaista moćno, poboljšavanje prijenosa MSA-na-DA-a od nule pucnjave na 10% F_1 (NER) i preciznosti od 2%. Imamo još bolje izvršenje u scenarijima sa ograničenim količinama označenih podataka. Provodimo ispitivanje ablacije i pokazujemo da se pojačava učinkovitost promatranja direktnih rezultata od povećanja podataka obuke mogućih sa primerima tužilaštva putem samouprave. To otvara prilike za razvoj modela tužioca koji koriste samo MSA resurse. Naš pristup se takođe može proširiti na druge jezike i zadatke.', 'sv': 'En tillräcklig mängd kommenterade data krävs vanligtvis för att finjustera färdigutbildade språkmodeller för nedströmsuppgifter. Tyvärr kan det vara dyrt att få fram märkta data, särskilt för flera språksorter och dialekter. Vi föreslår att man själv tränar färdigutbildade språkmodeller i noll- och få-skottsscenarier för att förbättra prestandan på dataknappa sorter med endast resurser från datarika. Vi visar nyttan av vårt tillvägagångssätt i samband med arabisk sekvensmärkning genom att använda en språkmodell finjusterad på Modern Standard Arabic (MSA) endast för att förutsäga namngivna entiteter (NE) och deltal (POS) taggar på flera dialektiska arabiska (DA) sorter. Vi visar att självträning verkligen är kraftfull, vilket förbättrar noll-shot MSA-till-DA överföring med så stor som 10% F_1 (NER) och 2% noggrannhet (POS tagging). Vi får ännu bättre prestanda i några skott scenarier med begränsade mängder märkta data. Vi genomför en ablationsstudie och visar att den prestationsförbättring som observerats direkt är resultatet av träningsdataökning möjlig med DA exempel via självträning. Detta öppnar upp möjligheter för utveckling av DA-modeller som endast utnyttjar MSA-resurser. Vårt tillvägagångssätt kan också utvidgas till andra språk och uppgifter.', 'ms': 'Jumlah data yang mencukupi yang dicatat biasanya diperlukan untuk menyesuaikan model bahasa yang dilatih dahulu untuk tugas turun. Malangnya, memperoleh data yang ditabel boleh mahal, terutama untuk berbagai jenis bahasa dan dialekt. We propose to self-train pre-trained language models in zero- and few-shot scenarios to improve performance on data-scarce varieties using only resources from data-rich ones.  Kami menunjukkan utiliti pendekatan kami dalam konteks penandaan jujukan Arab dengan menggunakan model bahasa yang disesuaikan dengan baik pada Arab Standard Modern (MSA) hanya untuk meramalkan tag entiti bernama (NE) dan sebahagian-dari-ucapan (POS) pada beberapa jenis Arab dialektal (DA). Kami menunjukkan bahawa latihan diri adalah benar-benar berkuasa, meningkatkan pemindahan MSA-ke-DA 0-shot dengan sebanyak 10% F_1 (NER) dan 2% akurasi (tag POS). We acquire even better performance in few-shot scenarios with limited amounts of labeled data.  Kami melakukan kajian ablasi dan menunjukkan bahawa peningkatan prestasi yang dilihat secara langsung hasil dari peningkatan data latihan mungkin dengan contoh DA melalui latihan diri. This opens up opportunities for developing DA models exploiting only MSA resources.  Pendekatan kita juga boleh diperluaskan kepada bahasa dan tugas lain.', 'ta': 'தொடர்ந்து பணிகளுக்கு முன் பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரிகளுக்கு பொருத்தமான குறிப்பிட்ட தகவல் வழக்கமாக தேவைப்படும். Unfortunately, attaining labeled data can be costly, especially for multiple language varieties and dialects.  பூஜ்ஜியம் மற்றும் சில தோற்றத்தில் நாமே பயிற்சி முன்பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரிகளுக்கு பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். தரவு செலவுகளில் இருந்து மட்டு மாதிரி நிலையான அரபி வரிசையில் பயன்பாட்டின் பயன்பாட்டை பயன்படுத்தும் மொழி மாதிரியை பயன்படுத்தி மாதிரி மாதிரி சரியான மாதிரியை பயன்படுத்தும் பொருள்கள் (NE) மற்றும் பேச்சின் பக தானே பயிற்சி உறுதியாக இருக்கிறது என்று நாம் காட்டுகிறோம். பூஜ்ஜியமாக எம்.ஏ-க்கு DA மாற்றுதல் மேம்படுத்துகிறது #10% F_ 1 (NER) மற்றும்  நாம் சில சுட்டு காட்சிகளில் சில செயல்பாட்டை செய்ய வேண்டும் மேலும் சிறந்த செயல்பாடு கிடைக்கும். நாங்கள் ஒரு முழுமையான ஆராய்ச்சி செய்து தானே பயிற்சி தரவு அதிகரிப்பிலிருந்து நேரடியாக பார்க்கப்பட்ட முடிவுகளை  இது MSA மூலங்களை மட்டும் பயன்படுத்துவதற்கான DA மாதிரிகளை உருவாக்கும் வாய்ப்புகளை திறக்கும். நம்முடைய அணுகல் மற்ற மொழிகளுக்கும் பணிகளுக்கும் விரிவாக்கப்பட முடியும்.', 'so': 'Sida caadiga ah waxaa loo baahan yahay in lagu sameyn karo tusaalooyin afka hore oo lagu tababaray oo ku filan macluumaad ku filan. Nasiib xumaatooyin marka la soo gaadho macluumaadka la qoray waa qaali karaan, gaar ahaan luuqado kala duduwan iyo luuqado kala duduwan. Waxaannu u soo jeedaynaa in aan iskuul ku tababarinno muusikada afka hore oo lagu tababariyey noocyo zero- iyo dhawr sawir ah, si aan u hagaajinno muuqashada ku saabsan kala duduwanta data-maalka oo yar, si aan ugu isticmaalno maal-taajirka oo kaliya. Waxaynu muujinnaa isticmaalka qaababkayaga marka lagu qorayo qoraalka Carabiga ee lagu isticmaalayo model-fin-tuned on Modern Standard Carabi (MSA) oo kaliya si aan u hor dhigno waxyaabaha la magacaabay (NE) iyo qayb ka mid ah hadalka (POS) tags oo ku qoran kala duduwan Carabi (DA). Waxaynu muujinnaa in iskuul-waxbarasho aad u xoog badan yahay, horumarinta wareejinta MSA-to-DA si weyn u ah 10% F_1 (NER) iyo 2% saxda (POS tagging). Waxaynu heli karnaa tababar aad u wanaagsan oo ay ku jiraan macluumaad aad u xadan. Waxbarashada dalbashada dalbashada waxaynu tusnaynaa in horumarinta tababarku uu toos u soo jeedo sababtoo ah kordhiska waxbarashada ee macluumaadka waxbarashada lagu heli karo tusaalayaal DA ah oo ku qoran iskuulka. Tanu wuxuu furan karaa fursado horumarinta modellada DA oo kaliya isticmaalka rasiliyadaha MSA. Dhaqdhaheenna waxaa sidoo kale lagu sii fidin karaa luuqado kale iyo shaqooyin kale.', 'ur': 'نیٹریسم ٹاکس کے لئے پیش تربین کی زبان موڈل کو نیٹ تربین کرنے کے لئے کافی اندازہ دکھائی ہوئی دکھائی کی ضرورت ہے. بدبختی کے ساتھ، لابلیٹ ڈیٹا حاصل کرنا بہت زیادہ ہے، مخصوصاً بہت سی زبان مختلف اور ڈیلکت کے لئے۔ ہم نے صفر اور تھوڑے شٹ سناریوں میں اپنے اوپر تطالب کی زبان مدل کی پیش آموزش کرنا پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ ڈاٹا کمزور مختلفوں پر صرف ڈاٹا ثروت سے استعمال کریں۔ ہم نے اپنے طریقے کا فائدہ عربی طریقے کے لابلینگ میں دکھایا ہے کہ ایک زبان مدل مطابق آزمائش استاندارڈ عربی (MSA) کے ذریعہ مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق صرف نام دار (NE) اور زبان کا ایک حصہ ٹاگ (POS) کے لئے مختلف مختلف عربی (DA) پر پیش ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ خود تعلیم یقیناً طاقتور ہے، صفر-شٹ MSA-to-DA ترافیس کے مطابق 10% F_1 (NER) اور 2% دقیق (POS ٹاگگ) کے مطابق بہترین کرتا ہے۔ ہم بہتر عمل حاصل کرتے ہیں کم شٹ سناریوں میں جو لکڑے ہوئے ڈیٹے کے اندر محدود ہیں۔ ہم ایک آبلیٹ پڑھنے کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ عملکرد کی تحقیق دکھائی ہوتی ہے کہ ڈا ا آپ ٹرینگ کے ذریعہ سے سیدھا نتائج اضافہ ہوتی ہے یہ صرف MSA منبع کے مطابق استعمال کرنے کے لئے ڈی ڈی موڈل کے لئے فرصت کھول دیتا ہے۔ ہمارا طریقہ بھی دوسری زبانوں اور کاموں کی طرف پھیلا سکتا ہے۔', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු භාෂාව මොඩේල්ස් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරධානය කරගන්න පුළුවන් තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරමාණයක අවාසනාවෙන්න, ලේබල් කරපු දත්ත ලබාගන්න පුළුවන්, විශේෂයෙන්ම විවිධ භාෂාවක් සහ ඩායිලක්ට් වල අපි ස්වයංග්\u200dරහණය කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු භාෂාව මොඩේල් වලට සුන්වර්ධයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා- සහ දත්ත ප්\u200dරශ්නයෙන් ප අපි අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය පෙන්වන්නේ අරාබි ක්\u200dරමණ ලේබිල් එකේ භාෂාවක් මොඩේල් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ක අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ස්වයං ප්\u200dරේෂණය ඇත්තටම ශක්තිමත් වෙනවා කියලා, සුන්ධ වෙඩි තියෙන්නේ MSA-to-DA ප්\u200dරවේශනය ෙ10% F_1 (NER) සහ 2% සාධාරණය අපි හොඳ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ගන්නවා වගේම ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ටිකක් විදිහට. අපි ක්\u200dරියාත්මක පරීක්ෂණයක් කරනවා ඒ වගේම පෙන්වන්නවා ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසිද් මේක අවස්ථාවක් විවෘත කරන්නේ DA මොඩේල්ස් විතරයි MSA මුළුත්වල් විතරයි. අපේ විදිහට අනිත් භාෂාවට සහ වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන්.', 'vi': 'Thông thường cần một lượng dữ liệu ghi chú đủ để hiệu chỉnh các mô hình ngôn ngữ sẵn sàng cho các công việc xuôi dòng. Đáng tiếc, đạt được dữ liệu được dán nhãn có thể rất tốn kém, đặc biệt là với đa dạng ngôn ngữ và phương ngữ. Chúng tôi đề nghị huấn luyện những mô hình ngôn ngữ sẵn sàng trong viễn cảnh vô vị và ngắn ngủi để cải thiện hiệu suất của các loại hiếm có dữ liệu chỉ sử dụng nguồn lực từ những loại giàu dữ liệu. Chúng tôi thể hiện sự hữu ích của phương pháp này trong trường hợp phân tích phân loại chữ A bằng cách sử dụng một mô hình ngôn ngữ chỉnh chính xác trên mẫu tiếng Ả Rập chuẩn hiện đại (MSA) chỉ để dự đoán các thực thể tên (N) và một phần của bài phát âm (POS) trên các chủng của ngôn ngữ Ả Rập (DA). Chúng tôi cho rằng sự tập tự của mình rất có sức mạnh, nâng cao sự giải quyết của chúng tôi bằng không bắt nó Chúng tôi có hiệu quả tốt hơn trong các viễn cảnh ngắn với một số lượng nhỏ dữ liệu dán nhãn. Chúng tôi thực hiện một nghiên cứu cắt bỏ và cho thấy khả năng nâng cao được quan sát trực tiếp là kết quả từ việc gia tăng dữ liệu đào tạo có thể với các ví dụ Việc này mở rộng cơ hội để phát triển các mô hình DA để chỉ khai thác nguồn lực của MSA. Cách tiếp cận của chúng ta cũng có thể mở rộng ngôn ngữ và nhiệm vụ khác.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Unfortunately, attaining labeled data can be costly, especially for multiple language varieties and dialects.  Biz o'z o'zimdan oldin o'rganilgan tilning modellarini o'zimga o'rganamiz, nuqta va bir necha shakllarga o'rganishni tasavvur qilamiz. Maʼlumotlar tarkibini faqat maʼlumotlar bilan o'zgarishni faqat o'zgarishga o'xshash tarkibini oshiri Biz bir necha dialek arab (DA) turlarida bir necha xil turli narsalarni koʻrsatish uchun gapiruvchimizni ko'rsatdik. Biz o'zining o'zimni o'zimga ishlatishni ko'rsatdik, bu 10% F_1 (NER) va 2% аниқ (POS teging) bilan hech narsa yozib yuboradi. Biz ko'proq cheksiz maʼlumot bilan bir necha ko'plab ko'plab ko'proq ko'plab ko'rinishimiz mumkin. Biz tashkilotni bajaramiz va bajarishni ko'rsatdik, taʼminlovchi maʼlumotni koʻpaytirish muvaffaqiyatlariga davom etish mumkin. Bu nafaqat MSA манзилларини таркиб қилиш учун DA modellari uchun imkoniyatlarni ochadi. Bizning usuli boshqa tillar va vazifalarga ko'payishimiz mumkin.", 'bg': 'Обикновено е необходимо достатъчно количество анотирани данни за фина настройка на предварително обучените езикови модели за задачи надолу по веригата. За съжаление, получаването на етикетирани данни може да бъде скъпо, особено за множество езикови разновидности и диалекти. Предлагаме самостоятелно обучение на предварително обучени езикови модели в нулеви и неколкократни сценарии, за да се подобри производителността на сортове с оскъдни данни, използвайки само ресурси от богати на данни. Ние демонстрираме полезността на нашия подход в контекста на етикетирането на арабски последователности чрез използване на езиков модел, фино настроен на съвременен стандартен арабски (МСА), само за да предвидим имена (НЕ) и част от речта (ПОС) тагове върху няколко диалектални арабски (ДА). Показваме, че самообучението наистина е мощно, подобрявайки трансфера с нулев изстрел до 10% точност (ПОС етикетиране). Ние придобиваме още по-добра производителност в няколко сценарии с ограничени количества етикетирани данни. Провеждаме аблационно проучване и показваме, че повишението на производителността, наблюдавано директно е резултат от увеличаването на данните за тренировка, възможно с примери за ДА чрез самообучение. Това отваря възможности за разработване на модели на ОД, използващи само ресурсите на МСА. Нашият подход може да бъде разширен и към други езици и задачи.', 'da': 'Der kræves normalt en tilstrækkelig mængde noterede data til at finjustere forududdannede sprogmodeller til downstream-opgaver. Desværre kan det være dyrt at opnå mærkede data, især for flere sprogsorter og dialekter. Vi foreslår selv at træne præ-trænede sprogmodeller i nul- og få-skudsscenarier for at forbedre ydeevnen på dataknappe sorter ved kun at bruge ressourcer fra datarige. Vi demonstrerer nytten af vores tilgang i forbindelse med arabisk sekvensmærkning ved at bruge en sprogmodel finjusteret på Modern Standard Arabic (MSA) kun til at forudsige navngivne entiteter (NE) og del-of-speech (POS) tags på flere dialektiske arabiske (DA) sorter. Vi viser, at selvtræning virkelig er kraftfuld og forbedrer nul-shot MSA-til-DA overførsel med helt op til 10% F_1 (NER) og 2% nøjagtighed (POS tagging). Vi opnår endnu bedre ydeevne i få skudsscenarier med begrænsede mængder mærkede data. Vi gennemfører en ablationsundersøgelse og viser, at den observerede præstationsboost direkte er resultatet af øget træningsdata mulig med DA eksempler via selvtræning. Dette åbner muligheder for at udvikle DA-modeller, der kun udnytter MSA-ressourcer. Vores tilgang kan også udvides til andre sprog og opgaver.', 'nl': "Een voldoende hoeveelheid geannoteerde gegevens is meestal nodig om vooraf getrainde taalmodellen voor downstreamtaken af te stemmen. Helaas kan het verkrijgen van gelabelde gegevens kostbaar zijn, vooral voor meerdere taalvariëteiten en dialecten. We stellen voor om voorgetrainde taalmodellen zelf te trainen in zero- en few-shot scenario's om de prestaties van dataschaarse variëteiten te verbeteren met behulp van alleen bronnen van datarijke variëteiten. We demonstreren het nut van onze aanpak in de context van Arabische sequentie labeling door gebruik te maken van een taalmodel dat is afgestemd op Modern Standard Arabic (MSA) alleen om benaming entities (NE) en part-of-speech (POS) tags te voorspellen op verschillende dialectische Arabische (DA) variëteiten. We laten zien dat zelftraining inderdaad krachtig is, waardoor de zero-shot MSA-to-DA overdracht tot 10% F_1 (NER) en 2% nauwkeurigheid (POS tagging) wordt verbeterd. We behalen nog betere prestaties in enkele-shot scenario's met beperkte hoeveelheden gelabelde gegevens. We voeren een ablatieonderzoek uit en laten zien dat de waargenomen prestatieboost direct het gevolg is van trainingsdata augmentatie mogelijk met DA voorbeelden via zelftraining. Dit opent mogelijkheden voor het ontwikkelen van DA-modellen waarbij alleen MSA-middelen worden benut. Onze aanpak kan ook worden uitgebreid naar andere talen en taken.", 'hr': 'Obično je potrebna dovoljna količina annotiranih podataka za finaliziranje predobučenih jezičkih modela za snižene zadatke. Nažalost, postizanje označenih podataka može biti skupo, posebno za višestruke jezičke razine i dijalekte. Predlažemo samobučenim jezičkim modelima u scenarijima nule i manje snimanja da poboljšamo učinkovitost raznih različitih manjih podataka koristeći samo resurse od bogatih podataka. Pokazujemo korisnost našeg pristupa u kontekstu označavanja arapske sekvence koristeći jezički model fino naveden na modernom standardnom arapskom (MSA) samo da predviđamo nazvane entitate (NE) i dijelogovorne etikete (POS) na nekoliko dijalektnih arapskih raznolika (DA). Pokazujemo da je samouvježba stvarno moćna, poboljšavanje prijenosa MSA-na-DA-a od nule pucnjave po velikoj to čnosti od 10% F_1 (NER) i 2% točnosti (označavanje POS-a). Dobili smo još bolju učinku u scenarijima s ograničenim količinama označenih podataka. Provodimo ispitivanje ablacije i pokazujemo da se pojačanje učinka promatralo direktno rezultate povećanja podataka o obuci mogućih s primjerima tužilaštva tijekom samouvježbe. To otvara prilike za razvoj modela tužioca koji koriste samo MSA resurse. Naš pristup se također može proširiti na druge jezike i zadatke.', 'de': 'Für die Feinabstimmung von vortrainierten Sprachmodellen für nachgelagerte Aufgaben ist in der Regel eine ausreichende Menge an annotierten Daten erforderlich. Leider kann das Erreichen von markierten Daten kostspielig sein, insbesondere bei mehreren Sprachvarianten und Dialekten. Wir schlagen vor, vortrainierte Sprachmodelle in Null- und Wenig-Schuss-Szenarien selbst zu trainieren, um die Leistung von datenknappen Varianten zu verbessern, indem nur Ressourcen aus datenreichen Varianten verwendet werden. Wir demonstrieren die Nützlichkeit unseres Ansatzes im Kontext der arabischen Sequenzmarkierung, indem wir ein auf Modern Standard Arabic (MSA) abgestimmtes Sprachmodell verwenden, um benannte Entitäten (NE) und Teile der Sprache (POS) Tags auf mehreren dialektalen arabischen (DA) Varianten vorherzusagen. Wir zeigen, dass Selbsttraining tatsächlich leistungsstark ist und den Zero-Shot MSA-to-DA Transfer um 10% F_1 (NER) und 2% Genauigkeit (POS Tagging) verbessert. Noch bessere Performance erzielen wir in wenigen Aufnahmen mit begrenzten Mengen beschrifteter Daten. Wir führen eine Ablationsstudie durch und zeigen, dass die beobachtete Leistungssteigerung direkt aus einer Trainingsdatenaugmentation resultiert, die mit DA-Beispielen über Selbsttraining möglich ist. Dies eröffnet Möglichkeiten für die Entwicklung von DA-Modellen, die nur MSA-Ressourcen nutzen. Unser Ansatz kann auch auf andere Sprachen und Aufgaben ausgedehnt werden.', 'ko': '일반적으로 하류 임무를 위해 미리 훈련된 언어 모델을 조정하기 위해서는 충분한 양의 주석이 있는 데이터가 필요하다.불행하게도, 표기 데이터를 얻는 대가가 높을 수 있으며, 특히 여러 언어의 변체와 사투리에 있어서는 그렇다.우리는 0렌즈와 소렌즈 장면에서 미리 훈련된 언어 모델에 대해 자기 훈련을 실시하여 데이터가 풍부한 언어 모델 중의 자원을 사용하여 데이터가 희소한 언어 모델의 성능을 향상시킬 것을 건의합니다.우리는 현대 표준 아랍어(MSA)에서 미세하게 조정된 언어 모델을 사용하여 몇 가지 방언 아랍어(DA) 변체에 있는 명명실체(NE)와 어성(POS) 표기를 예측함으로써 우리의 방법이 아랍어 서열 표기의 실용성을 증명하였다.우리는 제로 포MSA에서 DA로의 전환을 10%의 F 1(NER)과 2%의 정확성(어성 표시)으로 향상시키는 것이 자기 훈련에 확실히 효과가 있다는 것을 보여준다.우리는 소수의 렌즈 장면에서 더 좋은 성능을 얻었고 표기 데이터의 양이 제한되어 있다.우리가 융해 연구를 실시한 결과 관찰된 성능 향상은 훈련 데이터의 증가에서 비롯된 것이고 DA예는 자기 훈련을 통해 실현될 수 있다.이는 MSA 리소스만 사용하여 DA 모델을 개발할 수 있는 기회를 제공합니다.우리의 방법도 다른 언어와 임무로 확대될 수 있다.', 'id': 'Sebuah jumlah data yang cukup yang dicatat biasanya diperlukan untuk menyesuaikan model bahasa yang terlatih sebelumnya untuk tugas turun. Sayangnya, mencapai data labeled bisa mahal, terutama untuk berbagai jenis bahasa dan dialekt. Kami mengusulkan untuk melatih sendiri model bahasa pra-dilatih dalam skenario nol dan beberapa gambar untuk meningkatkan prestasi pada variasi data-jarang menggunakan hanya sumber daya dari yang kaya data. Kami menunjukkan utilitas pendekatan kami dalam konteks jaringan Arab dengan menggunakan model bahasa yang disesuaikan dengan baik pada Modern Standard Arabic (MSA) hanya untuk memprediksi entitas bernama (NE) dan bagian dari-pidato (POS) tag pada beberapa varietas dialektal Arab (DA). Kami menunjukkan bahwa latihan diri benar-benar kuat, meningkatkan transfer MSA-ke-DA dengan 0 tembakan sebesar 10% F_1 (NER) dan 2% akurasi (POS tagging). Kita bahkan mendapatkan prestasi yang lebih baik dalam beberapa skenario tembakan dengan jumlah terbatas data yang ditabel. Kami melakukan sebuah studi ablasi dan menunjukkan bahwa peningkatan prestasi yang diambil secara langsung hasil dari peningkatan data pelatihan mungkin dengan contoh DA melalui pelatihan diri. Ini membuka kesempatan untuk mengembangkan model DA yang hanya mengeksploitasi sumber daya MSA. Pendekatan kita juga dapat diperluaskan ke bahasa dan tugas lain.', 'fa': 'یک مقدار کافی از داده های یادآوری که معمولاً برای مدل های پیش آموزش زبانی برای کارهای پایین\u200cترین نیاز دارد نیاز دارد. متاسفانه، رسیدن داده\u200cهای برچسب می\u200cتواند ارزشمند باشد، مخصوصا برای مختلف زبانها و دیالکت\u200cهای متعدد باشد. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که مدل\u200cهای زبان پیش آموزش داده شده\u200cایم در صفر و سناریو\u200cهای کمی شلیک شده\u200cایم تا عملکرد روی گوناگون\u200cهای کم داده\u200cایم با استفاده از تنها منابع\u200cهای ثروتمندان داده\u200cایم بهتر شود. ما استفاده از دسترسی خود را در محیط برچسب برچسب برچسب برچسب برچسب برچسب عربی با استفاده از مدل زبانی که در عربی استاندارد مدرن (MSA) تنظیم شده فقط برای پیش بینی از برچسب\u200cهای نامیده شده (NE) و بخشی از برچسب\u200cهای سخنرانی (POS) در مختلف گونه\u200cهای عربی (DA) است. ما نشان می دهیم که آموزش خودخواهی واقعا قدرتمند است، بهترین انتقال MSA-to-DA صفر به اندازه ۱۰% F_1 (NER) و دقیق ۲% (POS tagging). ما هنوز عملکرد بهتر در سناریو های چند شلیک با مقدار محدودیت داده های برچسب می گیریم. ما یک مطالعه فعالیت را انجام می دهیم و نشان می دهیم که فعالیت مستقیماً نتیجه\u200cهایی را از افزایش داده\u200cهای آموزشی که ممکن است با مثال داده\u200cی داده\u200cی داده\u200cی داده\u200cها با توسط آموزش خودخواهی تح این فرصت\u200cهایی را برای توسعه مدل\u200cهای دادگاهی که تنها از منابع MSA استفاده می\u200cکنند باز می\u200cکند. روش ما هم می تواند به زبان و وظیفه های دیگر گسترش داده شود.', 'sw': 'A sufficient amount of annotated data is usually required to fine-tune pre-trained language models for downstream tasks.  Kwa bahati mbaya, kupata taarifa zilizowekwa inaweza kuwa gharama, hasa kwa lugha mbalimbali na lugha mbalimbali. Tunazipendekeza kujifunza mifano ya lugha zilizojifunza kabla ya kujifunza katika mitazamo yenye sifa- na machache yaliyopigwa picha ili kuboresha ufanisi wa ubora wa taarifa unaoendelea tofauti chache kwa kutumia rasilimali pekee kutoka kwa matajiri wenye taarifa. Tunaonyesha matumizi ya mbinu yetu katika muktadha wa mfumo wa lugha ya Kiarabu unaoelezea kwa kutumia mifano yenye ujumla mzuri katika Kiarabu wa Modern Standard (MSA) tu ili kutabiri vitu vinavyoitwa (NE) na sehemu ya lugha (POS) katika mabango mbalimbali ya Kiarabu (DA). Tunaonyesha kwamba mafunzo ya kujitegemea kwa hakika ni yenye nguvu, kwa kuboresha usafirishaji wa MSA-hadi-DA kwa kiasi kikubwa kama asilimia 10 F_1 (NER) na asilimia 2 yenyewe sahihi (alama ya POS). Tunapata utendaji bora zaidi katika mitazamo michache yenye idadi kubwa ya taarifa zilizowekwa. Tunafanya utafiti wa mafuta na kuonyesha kwamba ukuaji wa utendaji unaotangazwa moja kwa moja kutokana na kuongeza taarifa zinazowezekana na mifano ya DA kupitia mafunzo ya kujitegemea. Hii inafungua fursa kwa ajili ya kutengeneza mifano ya DA kutumia rasilimali za MSA pekee. Hatua yetu inaweza pia kupanuka kwa lugha na kazi nyingine.', 'tr': 'A çmak üçin adatça näçe terjime edilen maglumatlary düzeltmek üçin ýeterlik sany gerek. Gynansakda etiket edilen maglumatlary ýetmek üçin has bagly bolup biler, ýöne-de birnäçe diller we dialektler üçin. Biz özümizden öň-okuwçy dil nusgalaryny 0-da öňünden trenlemek üçin teklip berýäris- we az atly senaryýalarda data baýlygyndan diňe çeşmeleri ulanmak üçin üýtgetmegi teklip edýäris. Biz öz yaklaşymyzyň ullanyşyny arap sanlaryň etiketlerinde görkez diňe Modern Standart Arapça (MSA) adly zatlaryň (NE) we (POS) sanlarynyň birnäçe dialektal arapça (DA) täglerini ulanarak görkez. Biz öz-okuwçylygyň hakykatdanam güýçlidigini görkeýän, 0-atly MSA-dan-DA taýýarlamagyny 10% F_1 (NER) we 2% dogrylygyny (POS tagging) ýaly uly döredigini görkeýän. Biz birnäçe atly senaryýalarda diňe gowurak etmäge şartýarys. Biz ablasyon öwrenmesini ýerine ýetirdik we ukyplaryň üstünliklerini özüni öwrenmek bilen DA örnekleri bilen mümkin şekilde üýtgedigini görkez. Bu diňe MSA çeşmelerini ulanan DA nusgalaryny geliştirmek üçin mümkinçilikleri açar. Biziň ýaryşymyz başga dillere we işlerimize hem uzatlaşyp biler.', 'sq': 'Një sasi e mjaftueshme të dhënash të anotuara është zakonisht e kërkuar për të përshtatur modelet e gjuhës së paratrajnuar për detyrat e poshtme. Fatkeqësisht, arritja e të dhënave të etiketuara mund të jetë e shtrenjtë, veçanërisht për varietetet e shumta gjuhësh dhe dialektet. Ne propozojmë të trajnojmë vetë modelet e gjuhës së paratrajnuar në skenarë zero dhe pak fotografish për të përmirësuar performancën në varietetet e pakta të dhënash duke përdorur vetëm burime nga ato të pasura me të dhëna. Ne demonstrojmë utilitetin e qasjes sonë në kontekstin e etiketave të sekuencës arabe duke përdorur një model gjuhësh të përshtatur në Standard in Modern Arabic (MSA) vetëm për të parashikuar etiketat e njësive të emëruara (NE) dhe pjesë të fjalimit (POS) në disa varietete dialektale arabe (DA). Ne tregojmë se vetë-trajnimi është me të vërtetë i fuqishëm, duke përmirësuar transferimin zero-shot MSA-to-DA me aq të madhe sa  10% F_1 (NER) dhe 2% saktësi (POS tagging). Ne fitojmë performancë edhe më të mirë në skenarë me pak fotografi me sasi të kufizuara të dhënash të etiketuara. Ne kryejmë një studim ablacioni dhe tregojmë se rritja e performancës vëzhgoi drejtpërdrejt rezultatet nga rritja e të dhënave të trajnimit të mundshme me shembuj të prokurorit nëpërmjet vetë-trajnimit. Kjo hap mundësi për zhvillimin e modeleve të prokurorit që shfrytëzojnë vetëm burimet e MSA. Përqasja jonë mund të zgjerohet gjithashtu në gjuhë dhe detyra të tjera.', 'am': 'ወደታች ውኃ ስራዎችን ለመጠቀም የፊተኛውን የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎችን ለመጠቀም ይበቃል፡፡ በጸጥታ፣ የጽሑፍ ዳታ መግኘት ዋጋ ሊሆን ይችላል፣ በተለየ ቋንቋ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ እና አካላቢ ሊሆን ይችላል፡፡ የድምፅ ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎችን በzero እና ጥቂት ነጥቦች ላይ የዳታ-ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩነት ብቻ ከዳታ ባለ ሀብታሞች የተጠቃሚ ሀብትን በመጠቀም እናሳድጋለን፡፡ በዐረብኛ ቋንቋ (አሜሪካ) የተጠቃሚ የቋንቋ ሞዴል በመጠቀም እና የተባለውን አካባቢ (NE) እና የንግግር ክፍል (POS) ምልክቶች በተለየ ቋንቋ ቋንቋ (DA) በተለየ ልዩ ልዩ መለያየት ለመጠየቅ ብቻ ነው፡፡ የራሴ ትምህርት ኃይለኛ እንደሆነ እናሳየዋለን፤ የክፍለ አሜስካር-ወደ-DA ስንቀሳቅስ 10 በመቶ F_1 (NER) እና 2 በመቶ እርግጠኛ (POS tagging) እንዲያሳድግ ነው፡፡ We acquire even better performance in few-shot scenarios with limited amounts of labeled data.  የድምፅ አዳራሽ ትምህርት እናሳየዋለን እና የድምፅ አዳራሽ ከዳታ አዳራሽ ማስታወሻ በተቻለበት እናሳየዋለን፡፡ ይህ የ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ. የልዩ ቋንቋዎች እና ስራዎችን ለመዘረጋ ይችላል፡፡', 'af': "'n Geldige hoeveelheid aanmerkte data is gewoonlik benodig om voorafgeleerde taal modele te fin- tune vir onderstreem taak. Ongelukkig kan die beskrywing van etiketeerde data kosbaar wees, veral vir veelvuldige taal verskillighede en dialekte. Ons voorstel om self-trein voor-onderwerp taal modele in nul- en paar-skoot scenarios te verbeter prestasie op data- scarce varieties te gebruik slegs hulpbronne van data- rich ones. Ons wys die nutsprogram van ons toegang in die konteks van Arabiese sekvens etiketting deur 'n taal model fyn-tuned op Moderne Standaard Arabiese (MSA) slegs om genoemde entiteite (NE) en deel-van-spraak (POS) etikette te voorskou op verskeie dialektiese Arabiese (DA) verskillighede. Ons wys dat selfoerwinning regtig kragtig is, verbetering van nul-skoot MSA-na-DA oordrag deur so groot as $ 10% F_1 (NER) en 2% presies (POS merking). Ons kry selfs beter prestasie in 'n paar skoot scenarios met beperkte hoeveelheid etiketeerde data. Ons doen 'n ablasie studie en wys dat die uitvoerding verhoog het direk resultate van opvoerding van data verhoog wat moontlik is met DA voorbeelde deur self-opvoerding. Hierdie maak geleenthede oop vir die ontwikkeling van DA-modele wat slegs MSA-hulpbronne gebruik word. Ons toegang kan ook na ander tale en taak uitbrei word.", 'az': 'Daha aşağı təhsil işləri üçün təhsil edilmiş dil modellərini düzəltmək üçün çox təhsil edilmiş verilər lazımdır. Necə olaraq, etiketli məlumatlar tapmaq çoxlu dil müxtəlif və dialektlər üçün ucuz olar. Biz özümüzə təhsil edilmiş dil modellərini sıfır-sıfır-sıfırlı scenariolarda təhsil edirik ki, məlumatların zəif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif işləri yalnız verilənlərdən istifadə edərlər. Biz arab seçmə etiketlərinin istifadəsini təsdiqləyirik ki, moderni Standart Arab (MSA) ilə müxtəlif dil modeli istifadə edərək, sadəcə olaraq ünvanların (NE) və sözlərin bir parçasını təsdiqləyirik. Öz təhsil təhsil həqiqətən güclüdür, sıfır-shot MSA-to-DA transferini 10% F_1 (NER) və 2% ədaləti ilə yaxşılaşdırır. Biz az vuruş scenariyalarında hətta daha yaxşı performans alırıq ki, müəyyən edilmiş məlumatların sayısı ilə. Biz ablasiya təhsil etdik və göstəririk ki, performans təhsil etdiyi təhsil məlumatlarını təhsil etməkdən mümkün olaraq təhsil etməkdən təhsil edilmişdir. Bu, ancaq MSA resurslarını istifadə etmək üçün DA modellərini inkişaf etmək üçün fırsatları açar. Bizim yaxınlığımız də başqa dillərə və işlərə yayılabilir.', 'bn': 'ডাউস্ট্রীমের কাজের জন্য পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেলের জন্য যথেষ্ট পরিমাণ ব্যাখ্যা করা তথ্য প্রয়োজন। দুর্ভাগ্যবশত, লেবেল প্রাপ্ত তথ্যের জন্য মূল্য হতে পারে, বিশেষ করে বিভিন্ন ভাষার বৈচিত্র্য এবং ডায়ালেক We propose to self-train pre-trained language models in zero- and few-shot scenarios to improve performance on data-scarce varieties using only resources from data-rich ones.  We demonstrate the utility of our approach in the context of Arabic sequence labeling by using a language model fine-tuned on Modern Standard Arabic (MSA) only to predict named entities (NE) and part-of-speech (POS) tags on several dialectal Arabic (DA) varieties.  আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে স্বয়ংক্রিয় প্রশিক্ষণ সত্যিই শক্তিশালী, শুধুমাত্র এমএসএ-এ-ডি-এ পরিবর্তনের সুযোগ বৃদ্ধি পাচ্ছে যেমন ১০% এফ_১ (NER) এবং  আমরা সীমিত তথ্যের সাথে সীমাবদ্ধ কিছু গুলি দৃশ্যের মধ্যে আরো ভালো প্রদর্শন পাই। আমরা একটি আগুনের গবেষণা করছি এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে প্রদর্শনীর ফলাফল সরাসরি প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য যোগাযোগের ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে স্বেচ্ছাস্ত্ এটা শুধুমাত্র এমএসএ সম্পদ ব্যবহার করার জন্য ডিএ মডেল উন্নয়নের সুযোগ খুলে দেয়। আমাদের পদক্ষেপ অন্যান্য ভাষা এবং কাজে প্রসারিত হতে পারে।', 'ca': "A sufficient amount of annotated data is usually required to fine-tune pre-trained language models for downstream tasks.  Malauradament, aconseguir dades etiquetades pot ser costosa, especialment per a múltiples varietats de llenguatges i dialectes. Proposem formar-nos automàticament en models de llenguatge pré-entrenats en escenaris de zero i poces fotografies per millorar el rendiment en varietats escases de dades utilitzant només recursos provenents d'altres rics de dades. Demonstrem l'utilitat del nostre enfocament en el context de l'etiquetage de seqüència àrab utilitzant un model de llenguatge ben ajustat a l'àrab Estàndard Modern (MSA) només per predir etiquetes nomées (NE) i part-of-speech (POS) en diverses varietats dialectals àrabs (DA). We show that self-training is indeed powerful, improving zero-shot MSA-to-DA transfer by as large as  10% F_1 (NER) and 2% accuracy (POS tagging).  We acquire even better performance in few-shot scenarios with limited amounts of labeled data.  Fem un estudi d'ablació i demostrem que el reforç del rendiment observat directament resultats de l'augment de les dades d'entrenament possible amb exemples de DA mitjançant l'autoentrenament. This opens up opportunities for developing DA models exploiting only MSA resources.  El nostre enfocament també es pot estendre a altres llengües i tasques.", 'bs': 'Obično je potrebna dovoljna količina annotiranih podataka za finaliziranje predobučenih jezičkih modela za sledeće zadatke. Nažalost, postizanje označenih podataka može biti skupo, posebno za višestruke jezičke razlike i dijalekte. Predlažemo da se samouvježbamo predobučenim jezičkim modelima u scenarijima nule i nekoliko snimaka kako bi poboljšali učinkovitost raznolikosti manjih podataka koristeći samo resurse od bogatih podataka. Pokazujemo korisnost našeg pristupa u kontekstu označavanja arapske sekvence koristeći jezički model fino naveden na modernom standardnom arapskom (MSA) samo da predvidimo imenovane entitate (NE) i dijelogovorne etikete (POS) na nekoliko dijalektnih arapskih raznolika (DA). Pokazujemo da je samouvježba zaista moćna, poboljšavanje prijenosa MSA-na-DA-a od nule pucnjave po velikoj to čnosti od 10% F_1 (NER) i 2% tačnosti (označavanje POS-a). Mi dobijamo još bolje izvršenje u scenarijima sa ograničenim količinama označenih podataka. Provodimo ispitivanje ablacije i pokazujemo da se pojačanje učinka promatralo direktno rezultate od povećanja podataka obuke mogućih s primjerima tužioca putem samouprave. To otvara prilike za razvoj modela tužioca koji koriste samo MSA resurse. Naš pristup se također može proširiti na druge jezike i zadatke.', 'cs': 'K doladění předškolených jazykových modelů pro následné úkoly je obvykle zapotřebí dostatečné množství anotovaných dat. Bohužel, získání označených dat může být nákladné, zejména u více jazykových odrůd a dialektů. Navrhujeme vlastní trénink předškolených jazykových modelů v nulových a několika záběrech scénářích, abychom zlepšili výkon na datově vzácných variantách s využitím pouze zdrojů z těch bohatých na data. Použitím jazykového modelu vyladěného na moderní standardní arabštině (MSA) demonstrujeme užitečnost našeho přístupu v kontextu značení arabštiny pouze pro predikci pojmenovaných entit (NE) a části řeči (POS) na několika dialektálních arabštinách (DA). Ukazujeme, že samotný trénink je skutečně silný, zlepšuje nulový přenos MSA-to-DA o velikost 10% F_1 (NER) a 2% přesnost (POS tagging). Ještě lepší výkon získáváme v několika scénářích s omezeným množstvím označených dat. Provádíme ablační studii a ukážeme, že zvýšení výkonu pozorované přímo vyplývá z rozšíření tréninkových dat možného na příkladech DA prostřednictvím samotného tréninku. To otevírá příležitosti pro vývoj modelů DA využívajících pouze zdroje MSA. Náš přístup lze rozšířit i na další jazyky a úkoly.', 'et': 'Tavaliselt on vaja piisavalt märgitud andmeid eelõpetatud keelemudelite täpsustamiseks järgnevate ülesannete jaoks. Kahjuks võib märgistatud andmete saamine olla kulukas, eriti mitmete keeleliikide ja murrete puhul. Me teeme ettepaneku koolitada ise eelõpetatud keelemudeleid null- ja vähese pildiga stsenaariumides, et parandada andmepuudulike sortide jõudlust, kasutades ainult andmerikkatest sortidest saadud ressursse. Näitame oma lähenemisviisi kasulikkust araabia jadade märgistamise kontekstis, kasutades keelemudelit, mis on täpselt häälestatud Modern Standard Araabia (MSA) ainult nimeliste entiteetide (NE) ja kõneosa (POS) siltide ennustamiseks mitmes dialektilises araabia (DA) variandis. Me näitame, et isetreening on tõepoolest võimas, parandades null-shot MSA-DA ülekannet kuni 10% F_1 (NER) ja 2% täpsust (POS sildistamine). Saame veelgi parema jõudluse vähese pildi stsenaariumides, kus on piiratud kogus märgistatud andmeid. Viime läbi ablatsiooniuuringu ja näitame, et täheldatud jõudluse tõus tuleneb otseselt treeninguandmete suurendamisest, mis on võimalik DA näidetega enesetreeningu kaudu. See avab võimalused arendada arendusmudeleid, mis kasutavad ainult MSA ressursse. Meie lähenemisviisi saab laiendada ka teistele keeltele ja ülesannetele.', 'fi': 'Yleens채 tarvitaan riitt채v채 m채채r채 huomautuksia sis채lt채v채채 tietoa esikoulutettujen kielimallien hienos채채t철철n loppup채채n teht채viss채. Valitettavasti merkittyjen tietojen saaminen voi olla kallista, erityisesti monille kielilajikkeille ja murteille. Ehdotamme esikoulutettujen kielimallien itsekouluttamista nolla- ja muutaman kuvan skenaarioissa, jotta dataa niukasti sis채lt채vien lajikkeiden suorituskyky채 voidaan parantaa k채ytt채m채ll채 vain datarikkaista resursseista saatavia resursseja. Osoitamme l채hestymistapamme hy철dyllisyyden arabian sekvenssimerkinn채n yhteydess채 k채ytt채m채ll채 nykyajan standardiarabiaan (MSA) hienos채채detty채 kielimallia, jolla voidaan ennustaa nimettyj채 entiteettej채 (NE) ja osaa puheesta (POS) useilla murteellisilla arabialaisilla (DA) lajikkeilla. Osoitamme, ett채 itseharjoittelu on todella tehokasta, mik채 parantaa nollashotin MSA-DA-siirtoa jopa 10% F_1 (NER) ja 2% tarkkuutta (POS-tagging). Saamme viel채kin paremman suorituskyvyn muutamassa kuvassa tilanteissa, joissa on rajoitettu m채채r채 merkitty채 dataa. Toteutamme ablaatiotutkimuksen ja osoitamme, ett채 havaitut suorituskyvyn nousut johtuvat suoraan harjoitusdatan lis채채misest채, joka on mahdollista DA-esimerkeill채 itseharjoittelun kautta. T채m채 avaa mahdollisuuksia kehitt채채 vain MSA-resursseja hy철dynt채vi채 DA-malleja. L채hestymistapamme voidaan laajentaa my철s muihin kieliin ja teht채viin.', 'hy': 'A sufficient amount of annotated data is usually required to fine-tune pre-trained language models for downstream tasks.  Unfortunately, attaining labeled data can be costly, especially for multiple language varieties and dialects.  We propose to self-train pre-trained language models in zero- and few-shot scenarios to improve performance on data-scarce varieties using only resources from data-rich ones.  We demonstrate the utility of our approach in the context of Arabic sequence labeling by using a language model fine-tuned on Modern Standard Arabic (MSA) only to predict named entities (NE) and part-of-speech (POS) tags on several dialectal Arabic (DA) varieties.  We show that self-training is indeed powerful, improving zero-shot MSA-to-DA transfer by as large as  10% F_1 (NER) and 2% accuracy (POS tagging).  We acquire even better performance in few-shot scenarios with limited amounts of labeled data.  Մենք կատարում ենք աբլացիայի ուսումնասիրություն և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ արտադրողականության բարձրացումը անմիջապես հետևում է ուսուցման տվյալների աճի արդյունքներին, որոնք հնարավոր են DA օրինակների հետ ինքնավարժման This opens up opportunities for developing DA models exploiting only MSA resources.  Our approach can also be extended to other languages and tasks.', 'ha': "Ma'abun da ake ƙunsa da tsarin data da aka sanar da shi ya ƙayyade zuwa misãlai masu tsari wa zaman-tsari wa aikin downstram. Babu'am, da gaske danne da aka rubũta shi, za'a iya kasa kyauta, mai ƙayyade wa wasu irin harshe da aka ƙayyade. We propose to self-train pre-trained language models in zero- and few-shot scenarios to improve performance on data-scarce varieties using only resources from data-rich ones.  Tuna nũna amfani da aikin hanyarmu cikin muhalli na Larabci wanda aka yi musamman da misalin harshe mai fin-tuned kan masu motsi na Modern Default Carabi (MIA) kawai dõmin ka yi bayani ga abubuwa masu sunan abubuwa (NE) da rabo-faɗi (PSS) tags on wasu turnufafan Larabci (DA). Tuna nũna masu yin jiyya da kansa mai ƙarfi ne, mai improve transfer da haske-zuwa-DA da girma kamar /10% F_1 (NER) da 2% tabbatacce (tagning PoS). Tuna sami mafiya kyakkyawan sauri cikin sauran da aka samu ko da yawan mutane da aka rubũta. Munã tafiyar wani littãfi na rubutu kuma Muke nũna cewa mafarinta da aka nuna mutane na ƙara data da za'a iya iya iya amfani da misãlai na DA daga mutane kanza. Wannan yana buɗe fursa dõmin a buɗe masu motsi na DA da ke amfani da maɓallin SMA kawai. Tsarakanmu na iya shimfiɗa zuwa wasu harshe da aiki na dabam.", 'he': 'A sufficient amount of annotated data is usually required to fine-tune pre-trained language models for downstream tasks.  למרבה הצער, להשיג נתונים מסוימים יכול להיות יקר, במיוחד עבור מגוונים רבים של שפות ודיאלקטים. אנחנו מציעים להתאמן בעצמנו דוגמנים לשפה מאומנים מראש בתרחישים אפס ומעט צילומים כדי לשפר ביצועים על מגוונים נדירים של נתונים בשימוש רק משאבים מאותם עשירים במידע. We demonstrate the utility of our approach in the context of Arabic sequence labeling by using a language model fine-tuned on Modern Standard Arabic (MSA) only to predict named entities (NE) and part-of-speech (POS) tags on several dialectal Arabic (DA) varieties.  We show that self-training is indeed powerful, improving zero-shot MSA-to-DA transfer by as large as  10% F_1 (NER) and 2% accuracy (POS tagging).  אנחנו מקבלים ביצועים אפילו טובים יותר בתרחישים קטנים עם כמויות מוגבלות של נתונים מסוימים. אנו מבצעים מחקר אובלציה ולהראות שהדחיפת ההופעה צופה ישירות בתוצאות מגדלת נתוני אימון אפשרית עם דוגמאות התובע המחוזי באמצעות אימון עצמי. זה פותח הזדמנויות לפיתוח דוגמנים לתובע המחוזי שמניצלים רק משאבי MSA. הגישה שלנו יכולה גם להירחב לשפות אחרות ומשימות.', 'jv': 'Tuning Laih Awak dhéwé nggunakake perusahaan model sing luwih-luwih basa gampang ning awak dhéwé- lan padha-pisan sing perusahaan nggawe barang data-karo perusahaan langgar sami winih Awak dhéwé éntukno ngéwé éntukno kesempatan kanggo ngakses ngéwé ning disenyong arab sing ngegambar nggawe modèl kuwi kesempatan kanggo ngerasakno sistem anyar (NI) lan akèh-sampek (po S) sing paling dhéwé dialectal teka (Da). Awak dhéwé ngomong nik sesuk-preiane luwih tenan ngon barêng-barêng, njaluke nggawe barang-barêng SMA-nggo-da gawe lan tambah liyane © 10% F_1 (NeR) lan 2% kesempatan (PIS). Awak dhéwé éntuk luwih nggawe sawetara luwih-luwih sekènari karo pernik kuwi nggawe barang data. Awak dhéwé éntuk mulasai perbudhakan kanggo nyenggu nggawe akeh nyebuturan dhéwé, mengko perbudhakan kuwi nggawe data yang cukup nggawe Perusahaan Perusahaan kanggo diangkat oleh nggawe autor. Iki ngobuk akeh sing dibenakake kanggo nggawe model da bisa nguasai nggawe perusahaan SMA. Awakdhéwé éntuk iso nglanggar aturan kanggo langgar banjuré karo cara-cara.', 'bo': 'སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ཚད་ལྡན་ཞིབ་དགོས་པ་ཡིན ཡིན་ནའང་། attaining labeled data can be costly, especially for multiple language varieties and dialects. ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་མིང་བཏགས་པ་དང་། དཔག་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་སྐོར་ལས་ཀྱང་ཙམ་སྟོན་རྒྱུ་མཚན་དག་བཙལ་ We demonstrate the utility of our approach in the context of Arabic sequence labeling by using a language model fine-tuned on Modern Standard Arabic (MSA) only to predict named entities (NE) and part-of-speech (POS) tags on several dialectal Arabic (DA) varieties. ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ནུས་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྡན་པ་ཡིན་པས། རྣམ་གྲངས་མེད་པའི་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་བྱེད་ཚད་གཅིག་པུ་གཏོང་བ་ཞིང་། We acquire even better performance in few-shot scenarios with limited amounts of labeled data. ང་ཚོས་ལྕོགས་ཅན་གྱི་བརྩལ་ཞིག་བྱེད་སྐབས་ཡོད་ཚད་རྟོགས་པའི་ནང་གི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་མངོན་གསལ་བ་ཡོད་པ་ལས་སྟོན་པའི་རྐྱེན་ཚད འདིས་སྒེར་གྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཡུལ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་གོ་སྐབས་ཆ་ཁོ་ན་མངོན་གསལ་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ། ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་ལས་ཀ་གཞན་ཞིག་ལ་ཁྱབ་ཆོག་ཡོད་པ་རེད།', 'sk': 'Za natančno nastavitev vnaprej usposobljenih jezikovnih modelov za nadaljnja opravila je običajno potrebna zadostna količina podatkov z oznakami. Žal je lahko pridobivanje označenih podatkov drago, zlasti za več jezikovnih različic in narečij. Predlagamo samousposabljanje vnaprej usposobljenih jezikovnih modelov v ničelnih in malo posnetkih scenarijih za izboljšanje učinkovitosti pri sortah s pomanjkanjem podatkov z uporabo samo virov, ki so bogati s podatki. Uporabnost našega pristopa v kontekstu označevanja arabskega zaporedja dokazujemo z uporabo jezikovnega modela, ki je natančno nastavljen na Modern Standard Arabic (MSA), samo za napovedovanje oznak imenovanih entitet (NE) in del govora (POS) na več dialektnih arabskih različicah. Pokazali smo, da je samousposabljanje resnično močno, saj izboljšuje prenos MSA-do-DA brez strela za kar 10% F_1 (NER) in 2% natančnost (POS označevanje). Pridobimo še boljšo zmogljivost v scenarijih z nekaj posnetki z omejenimi količinami označenih podatkov. Izvedli smo študijo ablacije in pokazali, da je povečanje zmogljivosti, opaženo neposredno rezultat povečanja podatkov o vadbi, mogoče s primeri DA prek samovadbe. To odpira možnosti za razvoj modelov DA, ki izkoriščajo le vire MSA. Naš pristop se lahko razširi tudi na druge jezike in naloge.'}
{'en': 'Coordinate Constructions in English Enhanced Universal Dependencies : Analysis and Computational Modeling', 'ar': 'تنسيق الإنشاءات في التبعيات العالمية المحسنة باللغة الإنجليزية: التحليل والنمذجة الحاسوبية', 'pt': 'Construções de Coordenadas em Inglês Dependências Universais Aprimoradas: Análise e Modelagem Computacional', 'es': 'Construcciones de coordenadas en inglés Dependencias universales mejoradas: análisis y modelado computacional', 'fr': 'Constructions de coordonnées en anglais Dépendances universelles améliorées\xa0: analyse et modélisation informatique', 'ja': '英語でのコーディネート構築強化された普遍的依存関係：分析と計算モデリング', 'zh': '英语坐标构 增强型通倚:析计建模', 'hi': 'अंग्रेजी में समन्वय निर्माण उन्नत यूनिवर्सल निर्भरता: विश्लेषण और कम्प्यूटेशनल मॉडलिंग', 'ru': 'Координатные конструкции в английских расширенных универсальных зависимостях: анализ и вычислительное моделирование', 'ga': 'Comhordaigh Tógálacha i mBéarla Spleáchas Uilíoch Feabhsaithe: Anailís agus Samhaltú Ríomhaireachtúil', 'ka': 'კოორდინატის კონფიგურაციები ინგლისური უფრო მეტირებული სამყარო დასამყარებელობებით: ანალიზი და კომპუტაციალური მოდელირება', 'el': 'Ενισχυμένες καθολικές εξαρτήσεις: ανάλυση και υπολογιστική μοντελοποίηση', 'hu': 'Koordináta konstrukciók angolul Továbbfejlesztett univerzális függőségek: Elemzés és számítástechnikai modellezés', 'kk': 'Ағылшын тілінде координаттар құрылымдары Жалғастырылған Universal Dependencies: Analyze and Computational Modeling', 'it': 'Dipendenze universali potenziate: analisi e modellazione computazionale', 'mk': 'Координатни изградби на англиски зајакнети универзални зависности: анализа и компutaционално моделирање', 'lt': 'Koordinatų konstrukcijos anglų kalba Didesnės universaliosios priklausomybės: analizė ir kompiuterinis modeliavimas', 'mt': 'Kostruzzjonijiet tal-Koordinati bl-Ingliż Dipendenzi Universali mtejba: Analiżi u Mudellar Komputattiv', 'ml': 'ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയ യ യൂണിവറല്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന ക്രമീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d: അന്വേഷിക്കുക, കണക്കൂട്ടി', 'ms': 'Bina Koordinat dalam Bahasa Inggeris Diperkembangkan Dependensi Universal: Analisi dan Modelan Komputasi', 'mn': 'Англи хэлний координатын бүтээлүүд Өндөрсөн Universal Dependencies: Analysis and Computing Modeling', 'no': 'Koordinatkonstruksjonar i engelsk forbetra universelle avhengighet: Analyser og datamaskin', 'pl': 'Konstrukcje współrzędnych w języku angielskim Zwiększone zależności uniwersalne: analiza i modelowanie obliczeniowe', 'sr': 'Koordinate konstrukcije na engleskom jeziku poboljšane univerzalne zavisnosti: analiza i kompjuterska modela', 'ro': 'Construcții de coordonare în limba engleză Dependențe universale îmbunătățite: analiză și modelare computațională', 'so': 'Koordin dhismaha afka Ingiriis ku qoran ee lagu hagaajiyey dhamaanka university: Analysis and Computation Modeling', 'si': 'ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වල සංවිධානය නිර්මාණය විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂය සහ පරිගණික මොඩේලන්ගෙන', 'sv': 'Förbättrade universella beroenden: Analys och beräkningsmodellering', 'ur': 'انگلیسی انگلیسی میں کوئورڈینٹ بنانے کے لئے اضافہ کیا گیا Universal Dependencies: Analysis and Computational Modeling', 'ta': 'ஆங்கிலத்தில் மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட உலக சார்ந்திருப்புகளில் ஒருங்கிணைப்பு அமைப்புகள்:', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phối hợp xây dựng theo cấp độ rộng của chung rộng Anh:', 'bg': 'Подобрени универсални зависимости: анализ и изчислително моделиране', 'nl': 'Coördinaatconstructies in het Engels Verbeterde universele afhankelijkheden: analyse en computermodellering', 'hr': 'Koordinacijske konstrukcije na engleskom jeziku poboljšane univerzalne zavisnosti: analiza i računalna modela', 'da': 'Koordinatkonstruktioner på engelsk Forbedret universel afhængighed: Analyse og beregningsmodellering', 'de': 'Erweiterte universelle Abhängigkeiten: Analyse und rechnerische Modellierung', 'fa': 'ساختارهای koordinate در انگلیسی بستگی جهانی بیشتری شده: تحلیل و مدل کامپیوتری', 'id': 'Konstruksi Koordinat dalam bahasa Inggris Diperkembangkan Dependensi Universal: Analisi dan Modeling Komputasi', 'ko': '영어에서의 좌표 구조 강화의 보편적인 의존: 분석과 계산 모델링', 'tr': 'Iňlis dilinde Koordinatlar Jeçerli Wasplary: Analyz we Bilgisayar Modeli', 'af': 'Koordinate konstruksies in Engels Verbeter Universele afhengigheids: Analisie en Rekenaar Modelering', 'sq': 'Koordinate Constructions in English Enhanced Universal Dependencies: Analysis and Computational Modeling', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'sw': 'Miundombinu ya uratibu kwa Kiingereza Kutegemea Uingereza: Uchambuzi na Utafiti', 'hy': 'Անգլերենում բարելավված համաշխարհային կառուցվածքները՝ վերլուծություն և համակարգչային մոդելներ', 'bs': 'Koordinate konstrukcije na engleskom jeziku poboljšane univerzalne zavisnosti: analiza i kompjuterska modela', 'az': 'İngilizə dilində koordinat in şalları Enhanced Universal Dependencies: Analizi və Komputasiya Modeli', 'cs': 'Vylepšené univerzální závislosti: analýza a výpočetní modelování', 'et': 'Koordinaatide konstruktsioonid inglise keeles Suurendatud universaalsed sõltuvused: analüüs ja arvutuslik modelleerimine', 'fi': 'Koordinaattirakenteet englanniksi Enhanced Universal Dependences: Analysis and Computational Modeling', 'bn': 'ইংরেজিতে উন্নত বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের নির্ভরিত বৈশিষ্ট্য: বিশ্লেষণ এবং কম্পিউটিশন মোডেলিং', 'ca': 'Coordinate Constructions in English Enhanced Universal Dependences: Analysis and Computation Modelling', 'he': 'בניית קוורדינטות באנגלית תלויות יוניברסליות משותפות: ניתוח ומודל מחשבי', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Koordinatne konstrukcije v angleščini Izboljšane univerzalne odvisnosti: analiza in računalniško modeliranje', 'bo': 'Coordinate Constructions in English Enhanced Universal Dependencies: Analysis and Computational Modeling', 'jv': 'Ngubah Ukuhal-Ngubah Inggris Jejaring Universal Daerahan'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we address the representation of coordinate constructions in Enhanced Universal Dependencies (UD), where relevant dependency links are propagated from conjunction heads to other conjuncts. English treebanks for enhanced UD have been created from gold basic dependencies using a heuristic rule-based converter, which propagates only core arguments. With the aim of determining which set of links should be propagated from a semantic perspective, we create a large-scale dataset of manually edited syntax graphs. We identify several systematic errors in the original data, and propose to also propagate adjuncts. We observe high inter-annotator agreement for this semantic annotation task. Using our new manually verified dataset, we perform the first principled comparison of rule-based and (partially novel) machine-learning based methods for conjunction propagation for English. We show that learning propagation rules is more effective than hand-designing heuristic rules. When using automatic parses, our neural graph-parser based edge predictor outperforms the currently predominant pipelines using a basic-layer tree parser plus converters.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نتناول تمثيل الإنشاءات الإحداثية في التبعيات العالمية المحسنة (UD) ، حيث يتم نشر روابط التبعية ذات الصلة من رؤوس الاقتران إلى روابط أخرى. تم إنشاء بنوك الشجرة الإنجليزية لتحسين UD من التبعيات الأساسية للذهب باستخدام محول قائم على قواعد الكشف عن مجريات الأمور ، والذي ينشر الحجج الأساسية فقط. بهدف تحديد مجموعة الروابط التي يجب نشرها من منظور دلالي ، نقوم بإنشاء مجموعة بيانات واسعة النطاق من الرسوم البيانية النحوية التي تم تحريرها يدويًا. نحدد العديد من الأخطاء المنهجية في البيانات الأصلية ، ونقترح أيضًا نشر الملحقات. نلاحظ اتفاقًا عاليًا بين المعلقين التوضيحيين لمهمة التعليقات التوضيحية الدلالية هذه. باستخدام مجموعة البيانات الجديدة التي تم التحقق منها يدويًا ، نجري أول مقارنة مبدئية لطرق التعلم الآلي المستندة إلى القواعد و (الجديدة جزئيًا) القائمة على التعلم الآلي لنشر الاقتران للغة الإنجليزية. نظهر أن تعلم قواعد الانتشار أكثر فاعلية من تصميم القواعد الاستكشافية يدويًا. عند استخدام التحليل الآلي ، يتفوق متنبئ الحافة المعتمد على المحلل البياني العصبي الخاص بنا على خطوط الأنابيب السائدة حاليًا باستخدام محلل شجرة ذو طبقة أساسية بالإضافة إلى المحولات.', 'es': 'En este artículo, abordamos la representación de construcciones de coordenadas en Dependencias Universales Mejoradas (UD), donde los vínculos de dependencia relevantes se propagan desde las cabezas de conjunción a otras conjunciones. Los bancos de árboles en inglés para la UD mejorada se han creado a partir de dependencias básicas de oro utilizando un convertidor heurístico basado en reglas, que propaga solo los argumentos principales. Con el objetivo de determinar qué conjunto de enlaces debe propagarse desde una perspectiva semántica, creamos un conjunto de datos a gran escala de gráficos sintácticos editados manualmente. Identificamos varios errores sistemáticos en los datos originales y proponemos propagar también adjuntos. Observamos una alta concordancia entre anotadores para esta tarea de anotación semántica. Con nuestro nuevo conjunto de datos verificado manualmente, realizamos la primera comparación basada en principios de métodos basados en reglas y (parcialmente novedosos) basados en el aprendizaje automático para la propagación de conjunciones para el inglés. Demostramos que el aprendizaje de las reglas de propagación es más eficaz que el diseño manual de reglas heurísticas. Cuando se utilizan análisis automáticos, nuestro predictor de bordes basado en analizadores de gráficos neuronales supera a las canalizaciones predominantes actualmente utilizando un analizador de árbol de capas básico más convertidores.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, abordamos a representação de construções de coordenadas em Dependências Universais Aprimoradas (UD), onde links de dependência relevantes são propagados de cabeças de conjunção para outros conjuntos. Os treebanks em inglês para UD aprimorado foram criados a partir de dependências básicas de ouro usando um conversor heurístico baseado em regras, que propaga apenas os argumentos principais. Com o objetivo de determinar qual conjunto de links deve ser propagado de uma perspectiva semântica, criamos um conjunto de dados em larga escala de gráficos de sintaxe editados manualmente. Identificamos vários erros sistemáticos nos dados originais e propomos também propagar adjuntos. Observamos uma alta concordância entre anotadores para esta tarefa de anotação semântica. Usando nosso novo conjunto de dados verificado manualmente, realizamos a primeira comparação baseada em princípios de métodos baseados em regras e (parcialmente novos) baseados em aprendizado de máquina para propagação de conjunção para inglês. Mostramos que aprender regras de propagação é mais eficaz do que regras heurísticas desenhadas à mão. Ao usar análises automáticas, nosso preditor de borda baseado em analisador de gráfico neural supera os pipelines atualmente predominantes usando um analisador de árvore de camada básica mais conversores.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous abordons la représentation des constructions de coordonnées dans les dépendances universelles améliorées (UD), où les liens de dépendance pertinents sont propagés des têtes de conjonction vers d'autres conjonctions. Des banques d'arbres en anglais pour UD amélioré ont été créées à partir des dépendances de base Gold à l'aide d'un convertisseur heuristique basé sur des règles, qui ne propage que les arguments de base. Dans le but de déterminer quel ensemble de liens doit être propagé d'un point de vue sémantique, nous créons un ensemble de données à grande échelle de graphes syntaxiques édités manuellement. Nous identifions plusieurs erreurs systématiques dans les données d'origine, et proposons également de propager des adjonctions. Nous observons une forte concordance entre les annotateurs pour cette tâche d'annotation sémantique. À l'aide de notre nouvel ensemble de données vérifié manuellement, nous effectuons la première comparaison raisonnée de méthodes basées sur des règles et (partiellement nouvelles) basées sur l'apprentissage automatique pour la propagation de conjonction pour l'anglais. Nous montrons que l'apprentissage des règles de propagation est plus efficace que la conception manuelle de règles heuristiques. Lors de l'utilisation d'analyses automatiques, notre prédicteur de bord basé sur un analyseur de graphe neuronal surpasse les pipelines actuellement prédominants à l'aide d'un analyseur d'arbre de couche de base et de convertisseurs.", 'ru': 'В этой статье мы рассмотрим представление координатных конструкций в расширенных универсальных зависимостях (UD), где соответствующие связи зависимостей распространяются от конъюнктивных головок к другим конъюнктивам. Английские древовидные банки для расширенного UD были созданы из базовых зависимостей Gold с использованием эвристического преобразователя, основанного на правилах, который распространяет только основные аргументы. С целью определения того, какой набор ссылок следует распространять с семантической точки зрения, мы создаем крупномасштабный набор данных из отредактированных вручную синтаксических графиков. Мы выявляем несколько систематических ошибок в исходных данных, а также предлагаем распространять дополнения. Мы наблюдаем высокое согласие между аннотаторами для этой задачи семантической аннотации. Используя наш новый проверенный вручную набор данных, мы проводим первое принципиальное сравнение основанных на правилах и (частично) на машинном обучении методов распространения конъюнктуры для английского языка. Мы показываем, что правила распространения знаний более эффективны, чем ручная разработка эвристических правил. При использовании автоматических синтаксических анализов наш нейронный предиктор границ на основе анализатора графов превосходит преобладающие в настоящее время конвейеры, используя древовидный синтаксический анализатор базового уровня плюс конвертеры.', 'ja': '本稿では、関連する依存関係のリンクが連結ヘッドから他の結合点に伝播される、拡張ユニバーサル依存関係（ ＵＤ ）における座標構築の表現について述べる。 強化されたUDのための英語ツリーバンクは、コア引数のみを伝播するヒューリスティックルールベースのコンバータを使用して、GOLDの基本的な依存関係から作成されています。 セマンティックな観点からどのリンクセットを伝播すべきかを判断する目的で、手動で編集した構文グラフの大規模なデータセットを作成します。 私たちは、元のデータのいくつかの系統的な誤りを特定し、補助語の伝播も提案します。 私たちは、このセマンティック注釈タスクのための高い注釈者間合意を観察します。 新しい手動で検証されたデータセットを使用して、私たちは、英語のための連携伝播のためのルールベースおよび（部分的に新規の）機械学習ベースの方法の最初の原理的な比較を実行します。 ヒューリスティックルールを手作業で設計するよりも、伝播ルールを学習する方が効果的であることを示しています。 自動解析を使用する場合、当社のニューラルグラフ解析器ベースのエッジ予測器は、ベーシックレイヤーツリー解析器プラスコンバータを使用して、現在主流のパイプラインを上回ります。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम एन्हांस्ड यूनिवर्सल डिपेंडेंसी (यूडी) में समन्वय निर्माणों के प्रतिनिधित्व को संबोधित करते हैं, जहां प्रासंगिक निर्भरता लिंक को संयोजन प्रमुखों से अन्य conjuncts तक प्रचारित किया जाता है। संवर्धित यूडी के लिए अंग्रेजी ट्रीबैंक को एक हेरिस्टिक नियम-आधारित कनवर्टर का उपयोग करके सोने की बुनियादी निर्भरताओं से बनाया गया है, जो केवल मुख्य तर्कों का प्रचार करता है। यह निर्धारित करने के उद्देश्य से कि लिंक के किस सेट को शब्दार्थ परिप्रेक्ष्य से प्रचारित किया जाना चाहिए, हम मैन्युअल रूप से संपादित वाक्यविन्यास ग्राफ़ का एक बड़े पैमाने पर डेटासेट बनाते हैं। हम मूल डेटा में कई व्यवस्थित त्रुटियों की पहचान करते हैं, और सहायकों का प्रचार करने का भी प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम इस शब्दार्थ एनोटेशन कार्य के लिए उच्च अंतर-एनोटेटर समझौते का निरीक्षण करते हैं। हमारे नए मैन्युअल रूप से सत्यापित डेटासेट का उपयोग करते हुए, हम अंग्रेजी के लिए संयोजन प्रसार के लिए नियम-आधारित और (आंशिक रूप से उपन्यास) मशीन-लर्निंग आधारित विधियों की पहली सैद्धांतिक तुलना करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि प्रचार नियमों को सीखना हाथ से डिजाइन करने वाले ह्यूरिस्टिक नियमों की तुलना में अधिक प्रभावी है। स्वचालित पार्स का उपयोग करते समय, हमारे तंत्रिका ग्राफ-पार्सर आधारित किनारे के भविष्यवक्ता ने वर्तमान में एक बुनियादी परत पेड़ पार्सर प्लस कन्वर्टर्स का उपयोग करके प्रमुख पाइपलाइनों को मात दी है।', 'zh': '本文,臣等议增强型通用赖(UD)中坐标构造,其相关者链接自连词头播及他连词。 用增强型 UD 者英语树库用启发式则也转换器自黄金始,转换器传心参数。 为定当从语义角传哪组链接,创建一手动编辑语法图之大集。 于原始数据中得数系统误差,亦传其辅。 观此语义注事之高注器间一致性。 用我新手动验数集,于法与(新)基于机器学者英语连词传播方法一原则性较之。 吾示学传则,有效于手工启发式计。 用自解析者,神经图解析器边预测器善用本层树解析器转换器之要。', 'ga': "Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid aghaidh ar léiriú na tógála comhordanáidí i Spleáchais Uilíoch Feabhsaithe (UD), áit a ndéantar naisc spleáchais ábhartha a iomadú ó chinn cónaisc go comhcheangail eile. Cruthaíodh bainc chrainn Shasana le haghaidh UD feabhsaithe ó spleáchais bhunúsacha óir ag baint úsáide as tiontaire heorastúil bunaithe ar rialacha, a dhéanann iomadaíocht ar argóintí lárnacha amháin. D'fhonn a chinneadh cé acu sraith nasc ar cheart a iomadú ó pheirspictíocht shéimeantach, cruthaímid tacar sonraí ar scála mór de ghraif chomhréire arna gcur in eagar de láimh. Aithnímid roinnt earráidí córasacha sna sonraí bunaidh, agus molaimid forleagan a dhéanamh freisin. Breathnaímid ar chomhaontú ard idir-anótóra don tasc nótaí shéimeantach seo. Ag baint úsáide as ár dtacar sonraí nua arna bhfíorú de láimh, déanaimid an chéad chomparáid phrionsabail ar mhodhanna meaisín-bhunaithe atá bunaithe ar rialacha agus (páirt nua) chun cónascadh a iomadú don Bhéarla. Léirímid go bhfuil foghlaim rialacha iomadaithe níos éifeachtaí ná rialacha heorastúla a dhearadh de láimh. Nuair a bhíonn parsanna uathoibríocha á n-úsáid, éiríonn lenár réamhaithriseoir imeall néar-pharsálaí graf-pharsálaí ná na píblínte is mó faoi láthair trí úsáid a bhaint as parsálaí crann bunchiseal móide tiontairí.", 'it': "In questo articolo, affrontiamo la rappresentazione delle costruzioni di coordinate nelle dipendenze universali potenziate (UD), dove i collegamenti di dipendenza rilevanti sono propagati dalle teste di congiunzione ad altre congiunte. Gli treebank inglesi per UD potenziati sono stati creati dalle dipendenze di base gold utilizzando un convertitore euristico basato su regole, che propaga solo argomenti di base. Con l'obiettivo di determinare quale set di collegamenti dovrebbe essere propagato da una prospettiva semantica, creiamo un set di dati su larga scala di grafici sintassi modificati manualmente. Identifichiamo diversi errori sistematici nei dati originali e proponiamo di propagare anche aggiunte. Osserviamo un alto accordo inter-annotatore per questo compito di annotazione semantica. Utilizzando il nostro nuovo set di dati verificato manualmente, eseguiamo il primo confronto di principi tra metodi basati su regole e (parzialmente nuovi) di apprendimento automatico per la propagazione della congiunzione per l'inglese. Dimostriamo che imparare le regole di propagazione è più efficace che progettare a mano regole euristiche. Quando si utilizzano analisi automatiche, il nostro predittore di bordo basato su parser grafico neurale supera le pipeline attualmente predominanti utilizzando un parser albero di base più convertitori.", 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ დავწერეთ კოორდინატის კონფიგურაციების გამოსახულება უფრო მეტივე სამყარო განსახულებელობაში (UD), სადაც შესაძლებელი დასახულებელობის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურა ინგლისური საბოლოო საბოლოო UD-ის შესაძლებლობებისთვის მოქმედება, რომელიც მხოლოდ მნიშვნელოვანი არგუმენტების გამოყენებაც ჰეურისტიკური საბოლოო გადამყენებელ სემონტიკური პერსპექტიკის განსაზღვრების მიზეზით, რომელსაც კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციას უნდა გახსნა, ჩვენ ხელხილად რედაქტირებული სინტაქსი გრაფიკის დიდი მა ჩვენ განვიცნობით რამდენიმე სისტემატიკური შეცდომები პირველური მონაცემებში, და ჩვენ გვეძლებით დაახლოების გახსნა. ჩვენ შევხედავთ ამ სემონტიკური ამონიტაციის დავალებისთვის დიდი შანტიკური ამონიტაციის შესაძლებლობა. ჩვენი ახალი მონაცემების შესახებ, ჩვენ პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველ პირველ პირველ გადაწყვეტილების და (ფართოდ პრომენტიური) მანქანის სწავლების გადაწყვეტილების მეტოვების გადაწ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ სწავლობა პროპაგიაციის წესები უფრო ეფექტიურია, ვიდრე პროგრაციური წესები. როცა ავტომატიკური პარასტის გამოყენება, ჩვენი ნეიროლური გრაფიკის პარასტის დაბათებული მანძილური პროგრამეტრის პროგრამეტრის გამოყენება მიმდინარე მნიშვნელოვანი გა', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, εξετάζουμε την αναπαράσταση των κατασκευών συντεταγμένων σε Ενισχυμένες Οικουμενικές Εξαρτήσεις (όπου οι σχετικοί δεσμοί εξαρτήσεων διαδίδονται από κεφαλές σύνδεσης σε άλλες συναρτήσεις. Αγγλικές βάσεις δέντρων για βελτιωμένη UD έχουν δημιουργηθεί από βασικές εξαρτήσεις χρυσού χρησιμοποιώντας έναν ευριστικό μετατροπέα βασισμένο σε κανόνες, ο οποίος διαδίδει μόνο βασικά ορίσματα. Με στόχο τον προσδιορισμό του συνόλου συνδέσεων που θα πρέπει να διαδοθεί από μια σημασιολογική προοπτική, δημιουργούμε ένα μεγάλο σύνολο δεδομένων από χειροκίνητα επεξεργασμένα γραφήματα σύνταξης. Εντοπίζουμε αρκετά συστηματικά λάθη στα αρχικά δεδομένα και προτείνουμε επίσης να διαδοθούν συμπληρωματικά στοιχεία. Παρατηρούμε υψηλή συμφωνία μεταξύ σχολιαστών για αυτό το έργο σημασιολογικής σχολιασμού. Χρησιμοποιώντας το νέο χειροκίνητα επαληθευμένο σύνολο δεδομένων μας, διεξάγουμε την πρώτη αρχή σύγκριση μεθόδων που βασίζονται σε κανόνες και (εν μέρει καινοτόμες) μεθόδων μηχανικής μάθησης για τη διάδοση σύνδεσης στα αγγλικά. Δείχνουμε ότι η μάθηση των κανόνων διάδοσης είναι πιο αποτελεσματική από το χέρι-σχεδιασμό των heuristic κανόνων. Κατά τη χρήση αυτόματων αναλύσεων, ο προγνωστής άκρων που βασίζεται στον αναλύτη νευρωνικού γραφήματος ξεπερνά τις τρέχουσες κυρίαρχες αγωγές χρησιμοποιώντας έναν αναλυτή δέντρου βασικού στρώματος συν μετατροπείς.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban a koordináta-konstrukciók reprezentációjával foglalkozunk az Enhanced Universal Dependences (UD), ahol a releváns függőségi kapcsolatokat a konjunkciófejekről más konjunkciókra terjesztjük. A továbbfejlesztett UD angol fabankokat arany alapfüggőségekből hozták létre egy heurisztikus szabályalapú konvertáló segítségével, amely csak alapvető argumentumokat terjeszt. Annak meghatározására, hogy szemantikai perspektívából mely hivatkozásokat kell terjeszteni, létrehozunk egy nagyszabású adatkészletet manuálisan szerkesztett szintaxisgráfokból. Az eredeti adatokban több szisztematikus hibát azonosítunk, és javasoljuk a kiegészítők terjesztését is. Erre a szemantikai jegyzetelési feladatra vonatkozóan magas szintű inter-annotator megállapodást figyelünk meg. Új, manuálisan ellenőrzött adatkészletünk segítségével végezzük el az első elvi összehasonlítást a szabályalapú és (részben új) gépi tanuláson alapuló módszerekkel az angol konjunkciós terjesztésre. Megmutatjuk, hogy a terjesztési szabályok tanulása hatékonyabb, mint a heurisztikai szabályok kézi tervezése. Automatikus elemzések használata esetén neurális gráf-elemző alapú élelőrejelzőnk felülmúlja a jelenleg domináns csővezetékeket egy alaprétegű fa elemző plusz konvertálók segítségével.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kita alami perwakilan konstruksi koordinat dalam Dependensi Universal Enhanced (UD), di mana pautan dependensi yang relevan dipancarkan dari kepala konjunksi ke konjunksi lain. Pangkalan pokok Inggeris untuk UD bertambah tinggi telah dicipta dari dependensi asas emas menggunakan penyukar heuristik berdasarkan peraturan, yang hanya menyebarkan argumen utama. Dengan tujuan menentukan set pautan mana yang patut disebarkan dari perspektif semantik, kami mencipta set data skala besar graf sintaks yang disunting secara manual. Kami mengenalpasti beberapa ralat sistemik dalam data asal, dan melamar untuk menyebarkan tambahan. Kami mengamati persetujuan antar-annotator tinggi untuk tugas annotasi semantik ini. Dengan set data baru yang disahkan secara manual, kami melakukan perbandingan prinsip pertama dari kaedah pembelajaran mesin berdasarkan peraturan dan (sebahagian-baru) kaedah pembelajaran mesin untuk pembelajaran kongsi untuk bahasa Inggeris. Kami menunjukkan bahawa peraturan pembangunan belajar lebih efektif daripada peraturan heuristik merancang tangan. Apabila menggunakan hurai automatik, pengimbas pinggir berasaskan hurai-graf saraf kita melebihi garis paip yang kini berkuasa menggunakan hurai-hurai pokok lapisan asas tambah penyukar.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, біз координаттардың құрылымының көтерілген Universal Dependencies (UD) дегенді көрсетедік. Қатысушылық тәуелсіздік сілтемелерді қосылу бағыттардан басқа контакттарда таратылады. Ағылшын тілінде көтерілген UD үшін алтын негізгі тәуелдіктерінен құрылды. Бұл тек негізгі аргументтерді қолдану арқылы геуристикалық ережелер негізінде тәуелдіктерді қолданады. Семантикалық перспективадан қай сілтемелер жинағын анықтау үшін қолмен өңдеген синтаксис графиктерінің үлкен масштаб деректер жинағын құрамыз. Біз бастапқы деректерде бірнеше жүйелік қателерді анықтап, және қосымшаларды қосымша қосымша қолданып тастаймыз. Бұл semantic жазбалардың тапсырмасы үшін жазбалардың артықшылығын қараймыз. Жаңа деректер жиынымызды қолмен тексерілген қолдануға арналған, бірінші принцип ережелер негізінде және (бөлек романдық) машиналық оқыту әдістерін ағылшын тілінде қосылу үшін салыстырып жатыр Біз пропагациялық ережелерді қолмен дизайнер ережелерінен ең эффективні деп көрсетедік. Автоматты талдауды қолданғанда, негізгі қабаттың ағаш талдаушысын және аударушыларын қолдану үшін негізгі қабаттың шегін бақылау бақылаушысы көмектеседі.', 'mt': "F’dan id-dokument, nindirizzaw ir-rappreżentazzjoni ta’ kostruzzjonijiet ta’ koordinati f’Dipendenzi Universali mtejba (UD), fejn ir-rabtiet ta’ dipendenza rilevanti jiġu propagati minn kapijiet ta’ konġunzjoni għal konġunti oħra. Il-banek tas-siġar Ingliżi għal UD imtejba nħolqu minn dipendenzi bażiċi tad-deheb bl-użu ta’ konvertitur ibbażat fuq ir-regoli ewristiċi, li jippropaga biss l-argumenti ewlenin. Bil-għan li jiġi ddeterminat liema sett ta’ konnessjonijiet għandu jiġi propagat minn perspettiva semantika, a ħna nħolqu sett ta’ dejta fuq skala kbira ta’ graffi tas-sintaks editati manwalment. Aħna nidentifikaw diversi żbalji sistematiċi fid-dejta oriġinali, u nipproponu wkoll li jiġu propagati żidiet. Aħna nżommu qbil għoli bejn l-annotaturi għal dan il-kompitu semantiku ta' annotazzjoni. Bl-użu tas-sett tad-dejta l-ġdid ivverifikat manwalment tagħna, nagħmlu l-ewwel paragun prinċipjat ta’ metodi bbażati fuq ir-regoli u (parzjalment ġodda) ibbażati fuq it-tagħlim bil-magna għall-propagazzjoni konġunta għall-Ingliż. Aħna nuru li r-regoli dwar il-propagazzjoni tat-tagħlim huma aktar effettivi mit-tfassil tal-idejn tar-regoli ħewristiċi. Meta tuża analizzaturi awtomatiċi, il-previżur tat-tarf ibbażat fuq il-analizzatur tal-grafika newrali tagħna jaqbeż il-pajpijiet predominanti bħalissa bl-użu ta’ analizzatur tas-siġar tas-saff bażiku flimkien ma’ konvertituri.", 'mk': 'Во овој документ, ние се обраќаме на претставувањето на координатите конструкции во Зајакнетите универзални зависности (УД), каде релевантните зависни врски се пропагирани од глави на конекција до други конекции. English treebanks for enhanced UD have been created from gold basic dependencies using a heuristic rule-based converter, which propagates only core arguments.  Со цел да се одреди кој набор на врски треба да се пропагира од семантична перспектива, ние создаваме голем набор на податоци од рачно уредени синтаксични графики. Идентификуваме неколку систематски грешки во оригиналните податоци, и предложуваме исто така да се пропалираат додатоци. Гледаме висок интеранотаторски договор за оваа семантична анотациска задача. Користејќи го нашиот нов рачно верификуван компјутер на податоци, го спроведуваме првото принципирано споредување на правила и (делумно нови) методи на машинско учење за пропагација на комуникација на англиски. Ние покажуваме дека правилата за пропагација на учењето се поефикасни од рачното дизајнирање хеористички правила. Кога користиме автоматски анализи, нашиот предвидувач на раб базиран на нервен анализиран граф ги надминува моментално претежните гасоводи користејќи основен анализиран дрво на слој плус конвертери.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയ യൂണിവല്\u200d ഡിപ്പിന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ (യുഡി) യുടെ പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നു. പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ആശ്രയിക മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ട്രീബാങ്കുകള്\u200d സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണ അടിസ്ഥാനപരമായ ആശ്രയികളില്\u200d നിന്നും സൃഷ്ടിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സെമാന്റിക് ദൃശ്യത്തില്\u200d നിന്ന് ഏത് ലിങ്കുകള്\u200d പ്രോഗ്രാജ്യം ചെയ്യേണ്ടതാണ് എന്ന് തീരുമാനിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ലക്ഷ്യത്തില്\u200d, ഞങ നമ്മള്\u200d മൂല വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d കുറച്ച് സിസ്റ്റമിക്കക്കാര്\u200d തെറ്റുകള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നു. അപ്പോള്\u200d മാറ്റം വരു ഈ സെമാന്റിക് അഭിപ്രായത്തിന്റെ ജോലിക്കായി നമ്മള്\u200d ഉയര്\u200dത്തിയിരിക്കുന്ന അഭിപ്രായത്തിന് നമ്മുടെ പുതിയ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റാസെറ്റ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച്, ആദ്യത്തെ പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയ നിയമത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെയും പാര്\u200dട്ടിക്കാനു നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു ഹോരിസ്റ്റിക്ക് നിയമങ്ങളെക്കാള്\u200d പ്രപഞ്ചന ന നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത് കൂട സ്വയം പാര്\u200dസുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d ഗ്രാഫ്- പാര്\u200dസ് അടിസ്ഥാന വൃക്ഷത്തില്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിന്റെയും മാതൃകയുമായി ഇപ', 'no': 'I denne papiret adresserer vi representasjonen av koordinatkonstruksjonar i forbetra universelle avhengighet (UD), der relevante avhengighetslenkjer vert spretta frå kopla til andre konjunktar. Engelsk treebanklar for forbetra UD er laga frå gull grunnleggjande avhengighet med ein heuristisk regelbasert konverter, som berre spreier kjerneargumenter. Med målet å avgjere kva sett lenkjer skal propagarast frå ein semantisk perspektiv, lager vi ein stor skala datasett med manuelt redigerte syntaksgrafikk. Vi identifiserer fleire systematiske feil i opphavlege data, og foreslår også å sprei tillegg. We observe high inter- annotator agreement for this semantic annotation task. Med å bruka vår nye datasett manuelt verifisert, utfører vi den første prinsippet sammenligning av regelbaserte og (delvis novelle) maskinelæringsbaserte metodar for sambandsprogram for engelsk. Vi viser at læring av propagasjonsreglar er meir effektiv enn hand designing av heuristiske reglar. Når du brukar automatiske tolking, vil kantforhåndsvisinga vårt med neuralgraf-tolkaren utføra dei gjeldande rørlinjene med ein grunnleggjande tretolkar pluss konverterande.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид хамтын хамааралтай хамааралтай холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой хамтын толгойд бусад холбоотой орнуудын координатын бүтээлүүдийг илэрхийлдэг. Хөгжигдсэн UD-ын Англи хэлний загварууд нь алт үндсэн хамааралтай байдлаас бүтээсэн. Энэ нь зөвхөн үндсэн аргументуудыг ашиглаж буй хууль загваруудыг ашигладаг. Хоёр холбоотой холбоотой байдлаас шилжүүлэх зорилго нь бид гараар зохицуулсан синтаксис графикийн том хэмжээний өгөгдлийн санг бүтээж байна. Бид эхний өгөгдлийн системийн алдаа олон талаар тайлбарлаж, нарийвчлалуудыг бас дэлгэрүүлэхийг санал болно. Бид энэхүү семантийн анзаарлын даалгаварын тусламжтайгаар өндөр анзаарлын тусламжтайгаа ажиглаж байна. Өөрсдийн шинэ өгөгдлийн сангуудыг хэрэглэхэд бид анхны дүрэм дээр суурилсан, хэсэг шинэ машин суралцах сургалтын төлөвлөгөө Англи хэлний хамтдаа нийлүүлэх аргыг хийдэг. Бид суралцах хөгжлийн дүрмийг гараар загварчлахаас илүү үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Автоматик хуудас ашиглах үед бидний мэдрэлийн график хуваалцагчийн үндсэн хэсэг хуваалцагч нь үндсэн давхар мод хуваалцагчийг ашиглаж байгаа гол хоолойн шугамнуудыг ашигладаг.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente kalbame apie koordinačių konstrukcijų atstovavimą sustiprintose universaliose priklausomybėse (UD), kur atitinkamos priklausomybės sąsajos dauginamos iš jungiamųjų galvučių į kitus junginius. Didesnės UD anglų medžių bazės buvo sukurtos iš aukso bazinių priklausomybių naudojant heuristinį taisyklių konverterį, kuris daugina tik pagrindinius argumentus. Siekiant nustatyti, kokių sąsajų rinkinį reikėtų propaguoti semantine perspektyva, sukuriame didelį rankiniu būdu redaguotų sintaksų grafikų duomenų rinkinį. Nustatome keletą sistemingų originalių duomenų klaidų ir siūlome taip pat išplatinti priedus. We observe high inter-annotator agreement for this semantic annotation task.  Naudodamiesi savo nauju rankiniu būdu patikrintu duomenų rinkiniu, atliekame pirmąjį principinį taisyklėmis pagrįstų ir (iš dalies naujų) mašininio mokymosi metodų, skirtų anglų kalba skleisti jungtis, palyginimą. Mes parodome, kad mokymosi dauginimo taisyklės yra veiksmingesnės nei rankinių heuristinių taisyklių kūrimas. Naudojant automatinius analizatorius, mūsų nervinio grafiko analizatoriaus krašto prognozatorius viršija šiuo metu dominuojančius vamzdynus naudojant pagrindinio sluoksnio medienos analizatorių ir konverterius.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, abordăm reprezentarea construcțiilor de coordonate în Dependențe Universale Îmbunătățite (UD), unde legăturile relevante de dependență sunt propagate de la capete de conjuncție la alte conjuncte. Bazele de treebanks în limba engleză pentru UD îmbunătățit au fost create din dependențele de bază gold folosind un convertor bazat pe reguli euristice, care propagă doar argumentele de bază. Cu scopul de a determina ce set de linkuri ar trebui propagate dintr-o perspectivă semantică, creăm un set de date la scară largă de grafice sintaxiale editate manual. Identificăm mai multe erori sistematice în datele originale și propunem, de asemenea, propagarea adjuvantelor. Observăm un acord inter-adnotator ridicat pentru această sarcină de adnotare semantică. Folosind noul nostru set de date verificate manual, efectuăm prima comparație principială a metodelor bazate pe reguli și (parțial noi) de învățare automată pentru propagarea conjuncției în limba engleză. Noi arătăm că învățarea regulilor de propagare este mai eficientă decât proiectarea manuală a regulilor euristice. Atunci când se utilizează analize automate, predictorul nostru de margine bazat pe parser grafic neural depășește conductele predominante în prezent folosind un parser copac de nivel de bază plus convertoare.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ, අපි සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ (UD) වල සංවිධානයේ සංවිධානය සංවිධානය සම්බන්ධතා සම්බන්ධත ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ට්\u200dරෙබැන්ක්ස් විශේෂ UD වෙනුවෙන් සිද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සිද්ධ වෙලා තියෙන්නේ රත්තු මූලික විශේෂතාවක සෙමාන්ටික ප්\u200dරදේශයක් නිර්ධාරණය කරන්න අරමුණයෙන්, අපි ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණ දත්ත සෙට් හදන්නේ අත්තරයෙන් සැකසුම් සංවිධානය අපි ප්\u200dරධාන දත්තේ පරීක්ෂණ වැරදි වලින් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, සහ සම්බන්ධ විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන්. අපි බලාපොරොත්තු වෙන්නේ මේ සෙමාන්ටික් කිරීම් වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන් ඉහළ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම් අපේ අළුත් දත්ත සූදානයට පරීක්ෂා කරනවා, අපි පළමු ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් කරනවා නීති අධාරණය සහ (අංක්\u200dරියාත්මක)  අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරකාශනය නීතියක් ඉගෙන ගන්නේ අත් දිනාවට වඩා ප්\u200dරශ්ණයි. ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය විශ්ලේෂණය භාවිත කළොත්, අපේ න්\u200dයූරාල් ග්\u200dරාෆ් විශ්ලේෂණය අධ්\u200dයාත්මක පැත්ත ප්\u200dරශ්ණකය ප්\u200dරශ', 'pl': 'W artykule omówiono reprezentację konstrukcji współrzędnych w rozszerzonych zależnościach uniwersalnych (UD), gdzie odpowiednie powiązania zależności są propagowane z główek konjunkcji do innych konjunktów. Angielskie banki drzew dla ulepszonych UD zostały stworzone z podstawowych zależności złota przy użyciu heurystycznego konwertera opartego na regułach, który propaguje tylko argumenty podstawowe. W celu określenia, który zestaw linków powinien być propagowany z perspektywy semantycznej, tworzymy duży zestaw danych ręcznie edytowanych wykresów składni. Identyfikujemy kilka systematycznych błędów w oryginalnych danych i proponujemy również propagowanie dodatków. Obserwujemy wysoką zgodę między adnotatorami dla tego zadania adnotacji semantycznej. Korzystając z naszego nowego ręcznie zweryfikowanego zestawu danych, przeprowadzamy pierwsze zasadnicze porównanie opartych na regułach i (częściowo nowych) metod uczenia maszynowego opartych na propagacji połączeń dla języka angielskiego. Pokazujemy, że nauka reguł propagacji jest skuteczniejsza niż ręczne projektowanie reguł heurystycznych. Podczas korzystania z automatycznych analiz, nasz predyktor krawędzi oparty na analizowaniu wykresów neuronowych przewyższa obecnie dominujące rurociągi przy użyciu podstawowego parsera drzewa plus konwerterów.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaynu ku sheekeynaynaa wakiilka dhismaha koorsiinta ee lagu kordhiyey dhamaanka jaamacadda (UD), meesha xiriirka ku xiran xiriirka ku xiran ee lagu soo bandhigayo madaxa ururada iyo ururada kale. Rugta Ingiriiska ee UD la kordhiyey waxaa laga abuuray qiimaha aasaasiga ah oo dahab ah, kaas oo lagu isticmaalaa wareejiyaha sharciga horumarista ah oo kaliya muran asal ah. Ujeedada aad u baahan tahay in laguugu soo bandhiyo xiriir ka mid ah aragtida semantiga, waxaynu sameynaa koox macluumaad oo aad u badan oo lagu hagaajiyey sawirada cashuurta. Waxaynu aqoonsanaynaa qaar qaladyo nidaamka ah oo macluumaadka asalka ah, waxaana sidoo kale soo jeedinaynaa inaad horumarinno isbedelka. Waxaynu ilaalinaynaa heshiiska aad u dhexeeya ee arimahan la sheekeysto. Isku isticmaalayno kooxda macluumaadka ee cusub ee lagu xaqiijiyey, waxaynu sameynaa noocyada cusub ee ugu horeysa oo lagu barto sharciga qayb ahaan iyo qaababka lagu barto machine-based oo lagu barto afka Ingiriis. Waxaynu muujinnaa in sharciyada barashada ay ka shaqeeyaan sharciyada qoraalka horumarka. When using automatic parses, our neural graph-parser based edge predictor outperforms the currently predominant pipelines using a basic-layer tree parser plus converters.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats behandlar vi representation av koordinatskonstruktioner i Enhanced Universal Dependences (UD), där relevanta beroendelänkar sprids från konjunktionshuvuden till andra konjunktioner. Engelska trädbanker för utökad UD har skapats från guldbaserade beroenden med hjälp av en heuristisk regelbaserad omvandlare, som endast sprider kärnargument. I syfte att fastställa vilken uppsättning länkar som ska spridas ur ett semantiskt perspektiv skapar vi en storskalig datauppsättning manuellt redigerade syntaxgrafer. Vi identifierar flera systematiska fel i originaldata och föreslår att även tillägg sprids. Vi observerar hög inter-annotator överenskommelse för denna semantiska annotationsuppgift. Med hjälp av vårt nya manuellt verifierade dataset utför vi den första principiella jämförelsen av regelbaserade och (delvis nya) maskininlärningsbaserade metoder för konjunktionsspridning för engelska. Vi visar att lära sig förökningsregler är effektivare än att handutforma heuristiska regler. När du använder automatiska tolkningar, överträffar vår neurala graf-parser baserade kantprediktor de för närvarande dominerande rörledningarna med hjälp av en grundläggande lagerträdtolkare plus konverterare.', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں مشترک مقررہ بنانے کی تصویر کریں گے، جہاں معاملہ اعتباری لینکوں کی نسبت مختلف سروں سے دوسرے کنجونٹوں تک پھیلائی جاتی ہے۔ مہربانی UD کے لئے انگلیسی ٹریب بانک سونے کی بنیادی اعتباری سے پیدا کیے گئے ہیں، ایک ہوریستیک قانون بنیاد رکھنے والے کی استعمال سے، جو صرف اصلی ارجментوں کو پھیلاتا ہے. اس کے مطابق یہ ہے کہ کس لینکس کا مجموعہ سیمانٹیکی نظر سے پھیلائے جاتے ہیں، ہم نے ایک بڑی اسکیل ڈاٹ سٹ بنایا ہے جو ہاتھی سے سمجھی ہوئی سینٹکس گراف کے ساتھ سمجھی جاتی ہے. ہم نے اولین ڈیٹا میں کئی سیستماتیک خطائیں پہچان دیں اور اضافہ کرنے کے لئے بھی پیشنهاد کریں۔ ہم اس سیمنٹی اظہار کے لئے بلندی اظہار کرنے والی موافقت کو دیکھتے ہیں۔ ہمارے نئی دستی سے ثابت ہوئی ڈاٹ سٹ کو استعمال کرتے ہیں، ہم نخستین اصلی مقایسہ کریں گے، جو انگلیسی کے لئے جمع ہونے کے لئے مطابق کی مطابق ہے اور (حصۂ نئی) مطابق یادہانی کی بنیاد رکھنے کے لئے۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ پھیلانے کے قانون کی تعلیم ہاتھ طراحی کے قانون سے زیادہ اثر ہے۔ جب آٹوٹ پارس استعمال کرتے ہیں، ہمارے نئورل گراف پارس بنیادی اندھیر پیش بینی کرنے والی پائوٹ لینوں کو بنیادی-لائر تری پارس اور تبدیل کرنے والی استعمال کرتے ہیں.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒருங்கிணைப்பு கட்டும் மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட உலக சார்ந்த சார்புகளில் (UD) ஒருங்கிணைப்பு உருவாக்கத்தின் குறிப்பிடுதலை வி English treebanks for enhanced UD have been created from gold basic dependencies using a heuristic rule-based converter, which propagates only core arguments.  ஒரு பெமான்டிக் காட்சியிலிருந்து எந்த இணைப்புகள் பிராதிக்கப்பட வேண்டும் என்பதை தீர்மானிக்கும் செயலாக, நாம் ஒரு பெரிய அளவு தரவு  நாம் மூல தரவில் பல அமைப்பு பிழைகளை கண்டுபிடி நாங்கள் இந்த பெமான்டிக் அறிவிப்பு பணிக்கு உயர்ந்த ஒப்பந்தம் பார்க்கிறோம். எங்கள் புதிய தகவல் அமைப்பை பயன்படுத்தி, நாங்கள் விதிமுறையில் ஒப்பிட முதல் முதலில் செயல்படுத்துகிறோம் மற்றும் (பாகமாகும் நுழை) இயந்திரம்  நாம் கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் புதிய விதிகள் கையை வடிவமைப்பதை விட மிகவும் செல்லும் என்பதை காட்டுகிறோம். தானியங்கி பகுதிகளை பயன்படுத்தும்போது, எங்கள் புதிய வரைப்படத்தின் விளிம்பு முன்னோக்கி அல்லது தற்போது முக்கிய புள்ளிகளை அடிப்படை அடிப்பட', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru, obraćamo se predstavljanju koordinata konstrukcija u unapređenim univerzalnim zavisnostima (UD), gdje su relevantne veze zavisnosti proširene od glava veza na druge konjunkcije. Engleski treebanci za poboljšan UD stvoreni su iz zlatne osnovne zavisnosti koristeći heuristički konvertor na pravilima, koji propagava samo jezgrene argumente. Sa ciljem određivanja koji set veza treba da se proširi iz semantičke perspektive, stvaramo veliku skalu podataka sa ručno editiranim sintaksijskim grafikama. Identificiramo nekoliko sistematičnih grešaka u originalnim podacima, i predlažemo da se takođe proširimo i dodatke. Pratimo visok međuannotatorski sporazum za ovaj semantički zadatak za annotaciju. Koristeći našu novu rukovno ovjerenu kompaniju podataka, izvršili smo prvu principalnu usporedbu metoda na osnovu pravila i (djelomično novog) mašinskog učenja za propagaciju konjunkcije za engleski jezik. Mi pokazujemo da je učenje propagacije efikasnije nego dizajniranje heurističkih pravila. Kada koristimo automatske analize, naš predviđa č na granicama, osnovan na neuralnom grafiku, iznosi trenutno predominantne cijevi koristeći osnovno-slojni analizator drveta plus konvertere.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz AQSH (UD) davomida qoʻllanmalarning tashkilotlarini tasdiqlashimiz mumkin. Bu yerda muhim ishlatuvchi bogʻlamalarni bir xil boshqa bir xizmatlardan qaytadan qaytadi. Name Bogʻlamalarning qanday bogʻlamalarini qaysi semantik koʻrinishidan propagan boʻlishi uchun, biz qoʻlbola tahrirlangan syntax grafiklarni qoʻllanmalamiz. Biz asl maʼlumotdagi bir necha tizim xatolarini aniqlashimiz va o'zgarishlarni qaytadan boshlash talab qilamiz. Biz bu semantik taqdimot vazifasi uchun eng yuqori narsalarni ko'rsamiz. Yangi qoʻlbola tekshirilgan maʼlumotlar tarkibimizdan foydalanamiz, biz ingliz tili uchun birinchi qator asosiy va qismdan o'rganish asosiy mashina o'rganish usullarini bajaramiz. Biz o'rganishni o'rganish qoidalarini qo'llash qoidadan foydalanishini ko'rsatamiz. When using automatic parses, our neural graph-parser based edge predictor outperforms the currently predominant pipelines using a basic-layer tree parser plus converters.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề cập đến việc đại diện các cấu trúc phối hợp tại các quan hệ chung cấp cao (UD). Bản giá ba-lô tiếng Anh cho UD tăng cường đã được tạo ra từ các quan hệ cơ bản vàng nhờ vào một bộ chuyển đổi quy định, nó chỉ lan truyền các luận căn bản. Với mục đích xác định các liên kết nào nên được phát tán từ một quan điểm ngữ pháp, chúng tôi tạo ra một tập tin dữ liệu quy mô lớn của các biểu đồ pháp luật được biên soạn bằng tay. Chúng tôi xác định vài lỗi hệ thống trong dữ liệu gốc, và dự định sẽ cung cấp thêm chất phụ. Chúng tôi quan sát thỏa thuận liên tục quan đến nhiệm vụ ghi chú ngữ pháp. Sử dụng bộ dữ liệu mới được kiểm tra bằng tay, chúng tôi thực hiện cuộc so sánh nguyên tắc đầu tiên của phương pháp nghiên cứu máy móc (phần mới) cho việc kết hợp với tiếng Anh. Chúng tôi cho thấy quy tắc truyền học hiệu quả hơn là thiết kế tay các quy tắc thần kinh. Khi sử dụng phân tách tự động, bộ não dự đoán sơ đồ của bộ quét cạnh dựa vào bộ não thần kinh vượt qua khả năng sử dụng ống thông chính phủ.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия разглеждаме представянето на координатни конструкции в Увеличени универсални зависимости (УД), където съответните връзки на зависимост се разпространяват от конюнкционни глави към други конюнкти. Английските дървесни ленти за подобрен UD са създадени от златни основни зависимости с помощта на евристичен конвертор, който разпространява само основни аргументи. С цел да определим кой набор от връзки трябва да се разпространява от семантична гледна точка, създаваме мащабен набор от данни от ръчно редактирани синтаксисни графики. Идентифицираме няколко систематични грешки в оригиналните данни и предлагаме да се разпространяват и допълнения. Наблюдаваме високо междуанотаторно съгласие за тази семантична задача за анотация. Използвайки нашия нов ръчно проверен набор от данни, ние извършваме първото принципно сравнение на базирани на правила и (частично нови) базирани на машинно обучение методи за разпространение на конюции за английски език. Показваме, че изучаването на правилата за разпространение е по-ефективно от ръчното проектиране на евристични правила. Когато използвате автоматични анализи, нашият нервен графичен анализатор, базиран на ръбове, превъзхожда понастоящем преобладаващите тръбопроводи, използвайки основен слой дървоанализатор плюс конвертори.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru obraćamo se predstavljanje koordinata konstrukcija u poboljšanoj univerzalnoj zavisnosti (UD), gdje su relevantne veze zavisnosti proširene od glava kombinacije na druge kombinacije. Engleski treebanci za poboljšani UD stvoreni su iz zlatne osnovne zavisnosti koristeći heuristički konvertor na pravilima, koji propagava samo osnovne argumente. S ciljem određivanja koje skupine veza treba proširiti iz semantičke perspektive, stvaramo veliku skupinu podataka s ručno editiranim sintaksijskim grafikama. Identificiramo nekoliko sistematičnih grešaka u originalnim podacima, i predlažemo i proširiti dodatke. Primjatramo visok međuannotatorski sporazum za ovaj semantički zadatak za annotaciju. Koristeći našu novu rukovno potvrđenu kompletu podataka, izvršili smo prvu principalnu usporedbu metoda na osnovu pravila i (djelomično novog) mašinskog učenja za propagaciju konjunkcije za engleski jezik. Pokazujemo da je učenje propagacijskih pravila učinkovitije od dizajniranja ručnih pravila. Kada koristimo automatske analize, naš predviđa č na granici na temelju neuralnog grafa iznosi trenutno predominantne cijevi koristeći osnovno-slojni analizač drveta plus konvertera.', 'da': 'I denne artikel behandler vi repræsentationen af koordinatkonstruktioner i Enhanced Universal Dependences (UD), hvor relevante afhængighedsforbindelser spredes fra konjunktionshoveder til andre konjunkter. Engelske treebanks til forbedret UD er blevet oprettet fra guld grundlæggende afhængigheder ved hjælp af en heuristisk regelbaseret konverter, som kun udbreder kerneargumenter. Med det formål at bestemme, hvilke links der skal spredes ud fra et semantisk perspektiv, skaber vi et stort datasæt af manuelt redigerede syntaksgrafer. Vi identificerer flere systematiske fejl i de oprindelige data, og foreslår også at udbrede tillæg. Vi observerer høj inter-annotator aftale for denne semantiske annotation opgave. Ved hjælp af vores nye manuelt verificerede datasæt udfører vi den første principbaserede sammenligning af regelbaserede og (delvist nye) maskinlæringsbaserede metoder til konjunktion formering af engelsk. Vi viser, at læring af formeringsregler er mere effektiv end hånddesign af heuristiske regler. Når du bruger automatiske fortolkninger, overgår vores neurale graf-parser baserede kant predictor de aktuelt dominerende rørledninger ved hjælp af en basislag træ parser plus konvertere.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel bespreken we de representatie van coördinaatconstructies in Enhanced Universal Dependencies (UD), waar relevante afhankelijkheidskoppelingen worden verspreid van conjunctiekoppen naar andere conjuncten. Engelse boombanken voor verbeterde UD zijn gemaakt van gouden basisafhankelijkheden met behulp van een heuristische regelgebaseerde converter, die alleen kernargumenten propagert. Met als doel te bepalen welke set koppelingen vanuit semantisch perspectief moeten worden gepropageerd, maken we een grootschalige dataset van handmatig bewerkte syntaxigrafieken. We identificeren verschillende systematische fouten in de oorspronkelijke gegevens en stellen voor om ook adjuncts te verspreiden. We zien een hoge inter-annotator overeenkomst voor deze semantische annotatie taak. Met behulp van onze nieuwe handmatig geverifieerde dataset voeren we de eerste principiële vergelijking uit van regelgebaseerde en (deels nieuwe) machine learning gebaseerde methoden voor conjunctiepropagatie voor Engels. We laten zien dat het leren van propagatieregels effectiever is dan het handmatig ontwerpen van heuristische regels. Bij gebruik van automatische parsen presteert onze op neurale grafiekparser gebaseerde edge predictor de momenteel overheersende pipelines met behulp van een basic-layer tree parser plus converters.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag beschäftigen wir uns mit der Darstellung von Koordinatenkonstruktionen in Enhanced Universal Dependencies (UD), wo relevante Abhängigkeitsverbindungen von Konjunktionsköpfen auf andere Konjunkturen übertragen werden. Englische Baumbänke für erweiterte UD wurden aus Gold-Basisabhängigkeiten mithilfe eines heuristischen regelbasierten Konverters erstellt, der nur Kernargumente propagiert. Mit dem Ziel zu bestimmen, welcher Satz von Links aus semantischer Perspektive propagiert werden soll, erstellen wir einen großen Datensatz von manuell bearbeiteten Syntaxgraphen. Wir identifizieren mehrere systematische Fehler in den Originaldaten und schlagen vor, auch Ergänzungen zu verbreiten. Für diese semantische Annotationsaufgabe beobachten wir eine hohe Inter-Annotator-Übereinstimmung. Mit unserem neuen manuell verifizierten Datensatz führen wir den ersten prinzipiellen Vergleich regelbasierter und (teilweise neuartiger) maschineller Lernmethoden für die Konjunktionspropagation für Englisch durch. Wir zeigen, dass das Lernen von Propagationsregeln effektiver ist als das manuelle Entwerfen heuristischer Regeln. Bei der Verwendung von automatischen Parsen übertrifft unser neuronaler Graph-Parser-basierter Edge-Prädiktor die derzeit vorherrschenden Pipelines mit einem Basic-Layer-Baumparser plus Konvertern.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mengatasi representation dari konstruksi koordinat di Enhanced Universal Dependencies (UD), di mana hubungan dependensi relevan dipancarkan dari kepala konjunksi ke konjunksi lain. Pangkalan pohon Inggris untuk UD meningkat telah diciptakan dari dependensi dasar emas menggunakan konverter heuristik berdasarkan aturan, yang hanya menyebarkan argumen utama. With the aim of determining which set of links should be propagated from a semantic perspective, we create a large-scale dataset of manually edited syntax graphs.  Kami mengidentifikasi beberapa kesalahan sistematis dalam data asli, dan mengusulkan untuk menyebarkan tambahan. Kami mengamati kesepakatan inter annotator tinggi untuk tugas annotasi semantis ini. Menggunakan set data yang baru kami verifikasi secara manual, kami melakukan perbandingan prinsip pertama dari metode pembelajaran berbasis peraturan dan (sebagian novel) berbasis mesin untuk propagasi konjunksi bahasa Inggris. Kami menunjukkan bahwa peraturan propagasi belajar lebih efektif daripada peraturan heuristik desain tangan. When using automatic parses, our neural graph-parser based edge predictor outperforms the currently predominant pipelines using a basic-layer tree parser plus converters.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما نمایش ساختمان\u200cهای koordinated در بستگی\u200cهای جهانی بیشتر (UD) صحبت می\u200cکنیم، جایی که ارتباط بستگی\u200cهای مربوط به ارتباط\u200cهای دیگر از سرهای اتصال به ارتباط برقرار می\u200cشوند. برچسب\u200cهای انگلیسی برای UD بیشتر از بستگی\u200cهای بنیادی طلا با استفاده از یک تبدیل کننده\u200cی قانون بر اساس حوریستیک ایجاد شده\u200cاند، که تنها ارجментهای اصلی را تغییر می\u200cدهد. با هدف تعیین کردن کدام مجموعه ارتباط باید از یک دیدگاه semantic پخش شود، یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای مقیاس بزرگ از گراف\u200cهای سنتاکس دستی ویرایش شده ایم. ما چندین اشتباهی سیستمی را در داده های اصلی شناسایی می کنیم، و پیشنهاد می کنیم که اضافه\u200cها را هم گسترش دهیم. ما توافق بین\u200cآگاهی\u200cکننده\u200cهای بزرگ برای این وظیفه\u200cی آگاهی\u200cکننده\u200cهای semantic را مشاهده می\u200cکنیم. با استفاده از مجموعه داده\u200cهای جدیدی که به دستی تایید شده\u200cایم، ما اولین مقایسه اصلی از روش\u200cهای آموزش ماشین\u200cهای پایه\u200cی قانون و (بخشی از روش\u200cهای تایید) برای گسترش انگلیسی را انجام می\u200cدهیم. ما نشان می دهیم که یاد گرفتن قوانین گسترش بیشتری از طراحی قوانین حوریست است. وقتی استفاده از پردازش\u200cهای خودکار می\u200cکنیم، پیش\u200cبینی\u200cکننده\u200cی لبه\u200cهای غیرفعالی ما با استفاده از یک پردازش درخت\u200cهای بنیادی لایه\u200cها و تبدیل\u200cکننده\u200cها از خطوط\u200cهای بزرگ\u200cتر در حال حاضر بیشتر از آن انجام', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 증강형 범의존(UD)에서 좌표 구조의 표시를 논의했는데 그 중에서 관련 의존 링크가 연결 헤드에서 다른 연결으로 전파되었다.UD를 강화하는 영문 트리 라이브러리는 규칙 기반의 계발식 변환기를 사용하여goldbasic 의존항에서 만든 것으로 이 변환기는 핵심 파라미터만 전파합니다.의미 측면에서 어느 링크를 전파해야 하는지를 확인하기 위해 우리는 대규모 수동 편집 문법도 데이터 집합을 만들었다.우리는 원시 데이터에서 몇 가지 체계적인 오류를 발견했고 부가어도 전파할 것을 건의했다.이 의미 표시 임무에 대해 우리는 주석자 간의 높은 일치성을 관찰했다.우리의 새로운 수동 검증 데이터 집합을 사용하여 우리는 규칙과 (부분적으로 새로운) 기계 학습을 바탕으로 하는 영어 연어 전파 방법에 대해 첫 번째 원칙적인 비교를 실시했다.우리는 수동 디자인 계발식 규칙보다 학습 전파 규칙이 더 효과적임을 증명했다.자동 해석을 사용할 때, 우리는 신경도 해석기를 기반으로 하는 테두리 예측기가 현재 사용하는 기본 트리 해석기와 변환기를 사용하는 주류 파이프보다 우수하다.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne drejtohemi përfaqësimit të ndërtimeve të koordinatave në Varësitë Universale të Përmirësuara (UD), ku lidhjet e rëndësishme të varësisë përhapen nga kokat e lidhjeve në lidhje të tjera. Treebanks angleze për UD të përmirësuar janë krijuar nga varësitë e artë bazë duke përdorur një konverter heuristik bazuar në rregulla, i cili përhap vetëm argumentet thelbësore. Me qëllim të përcaktojmë se cili grup lidhjesh duhet të përhapet nga një perspektivë semantike, ne krijojmë një grup të dhënash në shkallë të madhe të grafikave të sintaksit të edituara manualisht. Ne identifikojmë disa gabime sistematike në të dhënat origjinale dhe propozojmë gjithashtu të përhapim shtesë. Ne vëzhgojmë marrëveshjen e lartë ndër-anotator për këtë detyrë semantike anotacioni. Duke përdorur grupin tonë të ri të të dhënave të verifikuara manualisht, ne kryejmë krahasimin e parë të parit të metodave të bazuara në rregulla dhe (pjesërisht të reja) të mësimit të makinave për përhapjen e bashkimit në anglisht. Ne tregojmë se rregullat e mësimit të përhapjes janë më të efektshme se rregullat heuristike që dizajnojnë duart. Kur përdorim analiza automatike, parashikuesi ynë i kufirit me bazë në analizuesin nervor të grafikës kalon tubacionet aktualisht mbizotëruese duke përdorur një analizues bazë të shtresave pemësh plus konverterët.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunazungumzia uwakilishaji wa majengo ya uratibu katika Utegemezaji wa Dunia (UD), ambapo viungo muhimu vya kutegemea vinavyotegemea vinavyotangazwa kutoka kwa wakuu wa ushirikiano mpaka mashirika mengine. Bendera ya miti ya Kiingereza kwa ajili ya UDD ya kuongezeka imetengenezwa kutokana na kutegemea misingi ya dhahabu kwa kutumia mabadiliko anayeishi na utawala wa kiserikali, ambayo yanatangaza hoja za msingi tu. Kwa lengo la kuamua vipi viungo vinavyopaswa kutangazwa kutoka kwenye mtazamo wa semantiki, tunatengeneza seti ya data kubwa ya picha za kompyuta zilizohaririwa manufaa. Tunajua makosa kadhaa ya mfumo katika takwimu za asili, na tunapendekeza pia kutangaza mabadiliko. We observe high inter-annotator agreement for this semantic annotation task.  Kwa kutumia seti zetu mpya zilizothibitishwa kwa manufaa, tunafanya kitendo cha kwanza ukilinganishwa na utawala na mbinu za kujifunza kwa njia za ushirikiano kwa Kiingereza. Tunaonyesha kuwa sheria za kujifunza za propaganda ni yenye ufanisi zaidi ya sheria za kuunda mkono. Wakati wakitumia mabango ya kujitegemea, michoro yetu ya ubora-mchangazaji anayeishi na utabiri wa kiwango kikubwa kinaonyesha mabango ya sasa yanayotawala kwa kutumia mti wa msingi wa ngazi pamoja na mabadiliko.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, adres ons die voorstelling van koordinate konstruksies in Verbeter Universele Afhanklikheid (UD), waar relevante afhanklikheid skakels word uitgespreek van konjunksie koppe na ander konjunksies. Engels treebanks vir verbeterde UD is geskep van goud basiese afhanklikhede gebruik van 'n heuristiese reël-gebaseerde omskakelaar, wat slegs kern argumente propagaat. Met die doel van die bepaal van watter stel skakels moet van 'n semantiese perspektief versprei word, skep ons 'n groot skaal datastel van Hand redigeerde sintaks grafieke. Ons identifiseer verskeie sistematiese foute in die oorspronklike data, en voorstel om ook toevoegings te spreek. Ons observer hoë inter- annotator ooreenkoms vir hierdie semantiese annotasie taak. By die gebruik van ons nuwe hand bevestig datastel, doen ons die eerste prinsipele vergelyking van reël gebaseer en (deel novel) masjien-leer gebaseerde metodes vir konjunksie propagasie vir Engels. Ons wys dat die leer van propagasie reëls meer effektief is as die hand-ontwerp van heuristiese reëls. Wanneer automaties verwerking gebruik word, sal ons neurale graaf-ontleerder gebaseerde rand voorskouer uitvoer die huidiglik voordekende pipelyne met 'n basiese laag boom ontleerder plus omskakelaars.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, biz gelişmiş Universal Dependencilerin (UD) içinde koordinat in şallarynyň temsillerini çykarýarys, nähili baglanylyk baglaýyşlaryň koplamak kellelerinden başga bir koplamağa uzaklaşdırılýar. Gelişmiş UD üçin iňlisler heuristik düzgünlerden ullanýar. Bu diňe esasy argümentlerden üýtgeýär. Semantik perspektivden hangy baglaýyşlaryň düzümlenmesini takyklamak üçin biz elimizden edilen syntaks grafikleriniň uly ölçekli bir datagropyny bejerdik. Biz başlangyç maglumatda birnäçe sistem hatalary tanyşdyrýarys we günahlary hem üýtgetmegi teklip edýäris Biz bu semantik duyarlama görevi üçin yüksek tuzaklaşma anlaşmasyna göz ardık. Täze sahyplarymyzy elimizden barlanýan düzgünlerimizi ullanýarys, biz iňlis dilinde birleşme taýýarlanmasy üçin ilkinji prinsipli düzgünlerimizi we (ýagdaýda novel) makina öwrenmesi üçin gurlap çykýarys. Biz öwrenmek kurallary el tasarlamaktan daha etkilidir. Otomatik çözümlerini ulananda, näyral grafik tanyşçymyz tabanly çöňki öňki hatlary temel-gatlak a ğaç täzeleçisi we üýtgeçilerimizi gowurar.', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ በተደጋጋሚ የታመነ ግንኙነት ከክፍል ራስ ወደ ሌሎቹ ግንኙነት አካባቢዎች የሚደረገውን አካባቢ ግንኙነቶችን (ዩዲ) እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የኢንግሊዝኛ ግንኙነት የዩዲ ግንኙነት አካባቢ ግንኙነት ከወርቅ መሠረት ግንኙነት የተፈጠረ ነው፡፡ አካባቢዎች ማንኛውን ግንኙነት ከስሜኒካዊ ስሜት እንዲለይ ለመፍጠር፣ በተለየ ትልቅ ዳታዎችን በእጃችን ያስተካክሉ ሲንካስር ቀለም እናደርጋለን፡፡ ብዙዎችን ስሕተት በመጀመሪያው ዳታዎች እናሳውቃለን እና ተሳካሪዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ለዚህ ስምናኒካዊ አካባቢ ስራ ከፍተኛ እናደርጋለን፡፡ አዲስ አዲስ ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም፣ የመጀመሪያውን የሥርዓት መሠረት እና (partially የመረጃ) መሳሪያዎችን ለመማር የኢንጂልኛ አካባቢ ፕሮግራምን ለመግለጥ ጥያቄን እናደርጋለን፡፡ እናሳያቸዋለን የፕሮግራፊ ሕግጋት ትምህርት ከሀሪክኛ ሥርዓት ይልቅ የተሻለ ነው፡፡ በኮምፕዩተር የተጠቃሚ ፕሮግራም-ተርሚናል፣ የናቡral ቀለም-ተርሚናል የፊደል ቅድሚያ የሚሰጡዋቸውን ፕሮግራሞች እና converters በመጠቀም አቅራቢያ የሚሰጡዋቸውን ፕላንፕላንዶች ያስተካክላሉ፡፡', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা উন্নত বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের নির্ভরশীল নির্মাণের প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্ব নিয়ে কথা বলি, যেখানে প্রাসঙ্গিক নির্ভরশীল ল লিঙ্কে সোনার মৌলিক ভিত্তিক শাসনের ভিত্তিক পরিবর্তন ব্যবহার করে ইংরেজি ট্রিব্যাংক সৃষ্টি করা হয়েছে, যা শুধুমাত্র মূল যুক্তি প্রচার করে। সেমেন্টিক দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি থেকে কোন লিঙ্ক প্রচার করার উদ্দেশ্য নির্ধারণের উদ্দেশ্যে আমরা একটি বিশাল স্ক্যালেট ডাটাসেট তৈরি করি হাত আমরা মূল তথ্যে বেশ কয়েকটি সিস্টেমিক ভুল চিহ্নিত করি এবং প্রস্তাব করি যে পরিস্থিতি প্রচার করতে পারে। আমরা এই সেম্যান্টিক ক্ষেত্রের জন্য বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন চুক্তি দেখতে পাচ্ছি। আমাদের নতুন ডাটাসেট ব্যবহার করে আমরা শাসনের ভিত্তিক তুলনায় প্রথম নীতির তুলনা করি এবং (অংশিকারের উপন্যাস) মেশিন-শিক্ষার ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি ই আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে প্রচারণা নিয়ম শিক্ষা হাতের ডিজাইনিং থেকে আরো কার্যকর। স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে পার্স ব্যবহার করার সময়, আমাদের নিউরেল গ্রাফ-পার্স ভিত্তিক প্রজাতি ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী ব্যবহার করে বর্তমানে মূল্যবান পাইপেল', 'ca': "En aquest paper, ens ocupem de la representació de les construccions de coordenades en Dependencies Universals Ampliades (UD), on els enllaços de dependencia pertinents es propaguen de cabells de connexió a altres connexions. S'han creat bancs d'arbres anglesos per a una UD millorada a partir de dependencies bàsiques d'or utilitzant un convertidor heurístic basat en regles, que només propaga arguments fonamentals. Amb l'objectiu de determinar quin conjunt de enllaços hauria de ser propagat d'una perspectiva semàntica, creem un conjunt de dades a gran escala de gràfics de sintaxi editats manualment. Identifiquem diversos errors sistemàtics en les dades originals i proposem també propagar adjunts. Observem un gran acord entre anotators per aquesta tasca semàntica d'anotació. Utilitzant el nostre nou conjunt de dades verificades manualment, fem la primera comparació en principis de mètodes basats en regles i (parcialment noves) d'aprenentatge automàtic per a la propagació de connexions en anglès. Mostrem que les regles d'aprenentatge de propagació són més efectives que les regles heurístiques de disseny manual. When using automatic parses, our neural graph-parser based edge predictor outperforms the currently predominant pipelines using a basic-layer tree parser plus converters.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku se zabýváme reprezentací souřadnicových konstrukcí v rozšířených univerzálních závislostech (UD), kde jsou relevantní závislostní vazby šířeny z hlav konjunkce do jiných konjunktů. Anglické stromové banky pro rozšířené UD byly vytvořeny ze zlatých základních závislostí pomocí heuristického konvertoru založeného na pravidlech, který šíří pouze základní argumenty. S cílem určit, která sada odkazů by měla být propagována ze sémantického hlediska, vytvoříme rozsáhlou datovou sadu ručně upravovaných syntaxi grafů. V původních datech identifikujeme několik systematických chyb a navrhujeme také šířit doplňky. Pro tento úkol sémantické anotace pozorujeme vysokou shodu mezi anotátory. Pomocí naší nové ručně ověřené sady dat provádíme první principové srovnání metod založených na pravidlech a (částečně nových) strojového učení založených na šíření konjunkcí pro angličtinu. Ukazujeme, že učení šíření pravidel je efektivnější než ruční navrhování heuristických pravidel. Při použití automatické analýzy náš prediktor hran založený na parseru neuronového grafu předčí aktuálně převažující potrubí pomocí parseru stromu základní vrstvy plus konvertorů.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru obraćamo se predstavljanju koordinata konstrukcija u poboljšanoj univerzalnoj zavisnosti (UD), gdje su relevantne veze zavisnosti proširene od glava veza na druge veze. Engleski treebanci za poboljšan UD stvoreni su iz zlatne osnovne zavisnosti koristeći heuristički konvertor na pravilima, koji propagava samo osnovne argumente. S ciljem određivanja koji set veza treba da se proširi iz semantičke perspektive, stvaramo veliku skupu podataka s rukom editiranim sintaksijskim grafikama. Identificiramo nekoliko sistematičnih grešaka u originalnim podacima, i predlažemo i proširiti dodatke. Primjatramo visok međuannotatorski sporazum za ovaj semantički zadatak za annotaciju. Koristeći našu novu rukovno potvrđenu kompaniju podataka, izvodimo prvo principalno usporedbu metoda na pravilima i (djelomično novom) mašinskog učenja za propagaciju konjunkcije za engleski jezik. Pokazujemo da je učenje propagacijskih pravila učinkovitija nego dizajniranje ruku heurističkih pravila. Kada koristimo automatske analize, naš predviđa č na ivici koji temelji na neuralnom grafiku predviđa trenutno predominantne cijevi koristeći osnovno-slojni analizač drveta plus konvertera.', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, müasir bağımlılıq bağlantıları birlikdə başlıqlarından başqa bağlantılara yayılan koordinat in şallarının təsdiqlənməsinə müraciət edirik. Yüksək UD üçün İngiliz tədbirləri altın temel bağlılıqlardan yaradılmışdır. Bu, heuristik qayda-temel dönüşücü vasitəsilə, sadəcə temel argumentləri propagat edir. Semantik perspektivdən hansı bağlantıların yayılması gerektiğini belə çəkmək məqsədilə, əlli düzenli sintaks grafiklərinin böyük ölçülü veri qurulması yaratdıq. Biz özündəki məlumatlarda sistematik xətaları tanıyırıq, həmçin in də əlavə edilməsini təbliğ edirik. Biz bu semantik danışma işi üçün yüksək inter-annotator anlaşmasını gözləyirik. Əvvəlki təsdiqlənmiş verilən qurbanlarımızı istifadə edərək, İngilizce dilində birləşdirilmək üçün ilk təsdiqlənmiş hökmlərin və (parçacıq yeni) maşın öyrənmə metodlarının müqayisəsini yerinə yetiririk. Biz göstəririk ki, öyrənmək propagasyon qaydaları əl dizaynlığı heuristik qaydalarından daha etkilidir. Avtomatik ayırışdırma işlədikdə, nöral grafik ayırıcımızın tabanlı çərçi öndəyicisi, həmin anda əsas düzlük a ğacı ayırıcısı və dönüşücüləri istifadə edir.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös käsitleme koordinaatide konstruktsioonide esitamist tõhustatud universaalsetes sõltuvustes (UD), kus asjakohaseid sõltuvuslikke seoseid levitatakse konjunktsioonipeadest teistesse konjunktsioonidesse. Inglise keele puupangad täiustatud UD jaoks on loodud kulla põhisõltuvustest heuristilise reeglipõhise muunduri abil, mis levitab ainult põhiargumente. Selleks, et määrata kindlaks, milliseid linke tuleks semantilisest perspektiivist levitada, loome käsitsi redigeeritud süntaksigraafikute suuremahulise andmekogumi. Me tuvastame esialgsetes andmetes mitmeid süstemaatilisi vigu ja teeme ettepaneku ka lisandmete levitamiseks. Selle semantilise annotatsiooni ülesande puhul täheldame suurt annotatoritevahelist kokkulepet. Kasutades oma uut käsitsi kontrollitud andmekogumit, teostame esimese põhimõttelise võrdluse reeglitel põhinevate ja (osaliselt uudsete) masinõppel põhinevate meetoditega inglise keele konjunktsioonide levimiseks. Näitame, et paljundusreeglite õppimine on efektiivsem kui käsitsi kujundatud heuristilised reeglid. Automaatse parsimise kasutamisel ületab meie neurograafilise parseri põhinev serva ennustaja praegu valdavaid torujuhtmeid, kasutades baaskihilist puuparserit pluss konvertereid.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa käsittelemme koordinaattikonstruktioiden esittämistä Enhanced Universal Dependences (UD), jossa merkityksellisiä riippuvuussuhteita levitetään konjunktiopäistä muihin konjunktioihin. Englantilaisia puupankkeja tehostetulle UD:lle on luotu kultaisista perusriippuvuuksista käyttäen heuristista sääntöpohjaista muunninta, joka levittää vain ydinargumentteja. Määrittääksemme, mitä linkkejä tulisi levittää semanttisesta näkökulmasta, luomme laajan tietojoukon manuaalisesti muokattuja syntaksikaavioita. Havaitsemme useita systemaattisia virheitä alkuperäisessä aineistossa ja ehdotamme myös lisäosien levittämistä. Havaitsemme suurta huomautusten välistä yhteisymmärrystä tässä semanttisessa huomautustehtävässä. Uuden manuaalisesti todennetun aineistomme avulla suoritamme ensimmäisen periaatteellisen vertailun sääntöpohjaisista ja (osittain uusista) koneoppimismenetelmistä konjunktioiden leviämiseen englannin kielellä. Osoitamme, että levityssääntöjen oppiminen on tehokkaampaa kuin heurististen sääntöjen manuaalinen suunnittelu. Automaattisia jäsennyksiä käytettäessä neurografiikkaparser-pohjainen reunaennuste ylittää nykyiset hallitsevat putkistot käyttämällä peruskerroksen puuparser plus muuntimet.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք դիտարկում ենք կոորդինային կառուցվածքների ներկայացումը բարելավված համաշխարհային կախվածություններում, որտեղ կախվածության կապերը տարածվում են հաղորդակցման գլխավորներից մյուս հաղորդակցվածներին: English treebanks for enhanced UD have been created from gold basic dependencies using a heuristic rule-based converter, which propagates only core arguments.  Որպեսզի որոշենք, թե ինչ կապեր պետք է տարածվի սեմանտիկ տեսանկյունից, մենք ստեղծում ենք ձեռքով խմբագրված սինտաքսի գրաֆիկների մեծ տվյալների համակարգ: We identify several systematic errors in the original data, and propose to also propagate adjuncts.  Մենք հետևում ենք բարձր ինտերնտոտորային համաձայնություն այս սեմանտիկ annoտացիայի խնդրի համար: Օգտագործելով մեր նոր ձեռքով ստուգելի տվյալների համակարգը, մենք կատարում ենք օրենքներով հիմնված և (մասամբ նոր) մեքենային ուսումնասիրության հիմնված մեթոդների առաջին համեմատությունը անգլերենի հաղորդակցման համար: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ սովորելու տարածման կանոնները ավելի արդյունավետ են, քան ձեռքի ստեղծման հորիստիկ կանոնները: Օգտագործելով ավտոմատիկ վերլուծումներ, մեր նյարդային գրաֆիկի վերլուծում հիմնված եզերքին կանխատեսողը գերազանցում է ներկայումս գոյություն ունեցող խողովակաշարերը օգտագործելով հիմնական շերտ ծառի վերլուծում գումարած վերա', 'sk': 'V tem prispevku obravnavamo predstavitev koordinatnih konstrukcij v okrepljenih univerzalnih odvisnostih (UD), kjer se ustrezne povezave odvisnosti razširjajo iz konjunkcijskih glav v druge konjunkte. Angleške dreebanke za izboljšano UD so bile ustvarjene iz zlatih osnovnih odvisnosti z uporabo heurističnega pretvornika, ki temelji na pravilih, ki širi samo osnovne argumente. Z namenom ugotovitve, kateri nabor povezav je treba razširiti s semantičnega vidika, ustvarimo obsežen nabor podatkov ročno urejenih sintaksnih grafov. Ugotavljamo več sistematičnih napak v izvirnih podatkih in predlagamo tudi širjenje dodatkov. Za to semantično nalogo označevanja opažamo visoko soglasje med opombatorji. Z novim ročno preverjenim naborom podatkov izvajamo prvo načelno primerjavo pravil temelječih in (delno novih) metod strojnega učenja za razmnoževanje konjunkcij za angleščino. Pokazali smo, da je učenje pravil razmnoževanja učinkovitejše od ročnega oblikovanja heurističnih pravil. Pri uporabi samodejnega razčlenjevanja naš napovedovalec robov, ki temelji na razčlenjevalniku nevronskih grafov, presega trenutno prevladujoče cevovode z uporabo osnovnega razčlenjevalnika dreves plus pretvornikov.', 'ha': "A cikin wannan takardan, Munã address the name of the Coordinate Bulganda na Enhanced Universal Deputs (UD), a inda za'a sanar da linki masu inganci daga samar-junkawa zuwa wasu conjuncts. An halitta Treebanks na Ingiriya wa an ƙara UD daga asalin gulĩno, an yi amfani da mai shigetarwa a heuristic rule, wanda ke bayana murafan bayani kawai. Ga ya yi fatan ka ƙayyade wanne linki ya kamata a bayyana shi daga wani fili na semantic, za'a ƙiƙira kodi mai girma da aka taɓa fassaran sigogi da hannayen da aka taɓa. Munã gane wasu ɓata na'ura cikin bayani na farko, kuma Muke buƙaitar da za'a sami bayani. Muna sami makubalci mai tsawo wa wannan aikin mai sanarwa na semantic. Yi amfani da zane-zanen da aka tabbatar da hannayenmu, za mu yi aiki na farkon kima samfani ga masu rubutun da (rabon yanzu) zane-zane-zane-bincike wa zane-zane-zane-zane wa zane-zane-zane-zane da za'a bayyana haɗi zuwa Ingiriya. Tuna nũna cewa karatun in karantawa za'a iya da mafiya amfani ko na'anar kunnufi. Idan ya yi amfani da parse farat-farat, babu basalin gefen-parse na neural ko na samar da piilenai masu ƙaranci da ke yanzu da amfani da wata itãcen salon-layar-danne masu basu'ar parse+-mai musanya.", 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מתייחסים לייצגת בניינים של קואורדינטים בתיכונות Universal Enhanced (UD), שבו קשרי תלויות רלוונטיים מתפשטים מראשי קונציונציה לקונציונציות אחרות. English treebanks for enhanced UD have been created from gold basic dependencies using a heuristic rule-based converter, which propagates only core arguments.  עם המטרה לקבוע איזה קבוצה של קשרים צריכה להתפשט מנקודת מבט סמנטית, אנחנו יוצרים קבוצת מידע גדולה של גרפים סינטקסי שעוררים ידנית. אנחנו מזהה כמה טעויות מערכתיות במידע המקורי, והצענו גם להפיץ תוספים. אנו צופים בהסכם בין הערות גבוה למשימת הערות הסמנטית הזאת. באמצעות קבוצת הנתונים החדשה שלנו מאושרת ידנית, אנחנו מבצעים את השוואה הראשונה בעקרונות של שיטות המבוססים על חוקים (חלקית חדשות) ללמוד מכונות למתורבות קונציונציה לאנגלית. We show that learning propagation rules is more effective than hand-designing heuristic rules.  כשמשתמשים במחקרים אוטומטיים, המחקר הגרפים העצביים שלנו מבוסס על ציפים מתגבר על צינורות הנוכחים בשימוש במחקר עץ בשכבת בסיסית ועוד מערבים.', 'jv': 'Nang pepulan iki, kita nguasai representation of the co-ordinate Iwak barêng-barêng Inggris kanggo didasai ngéwé, dino sing wis dipunangé perusahaan winih Jejaring Awak dhéwé nggoleki sistem sing eror kanggo awak dhéwé tanggal nggawe We online Packages Awak dhéwé ngerti, nglanggar aturan protagurasi luwih apik sing luwih apik tur angel. Tool Options, Layersdock', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བའི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བ་དེ་ཚོར་མཉམ་ལས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་གཞན་ཞིག་ལ་སྟོན་ཡོད་པ་རེད། English treebanks for enhanced UD have been created from gold basic dependencies using a heuristic rule-based converter, which propagates only core arguments. With the aim of determining which set of links should be propagated from a semantic perspective, we create a large-scale dataset of manually edited syntax graphs. ང་ཚོས་ཐོག་མའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱུད་ལྡན་པའི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་བྱ་སྟངས་ལ་མཐོང་བ་དང་མཐོང་སྣང་མཐོང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། We use our new manually verified dataset, we perform the first principled comparison of rule-based and (partially novel) machine-learning based methods for conjunction propagation for English. ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་འགྲོ་སློང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ནུས་པ་ལས་བཟོ་བཅོས་པ་ཡིན་པས། When using automatic parses, our neural graph-parser based edge predictor outperforms the currently predominant pipelines using a basic-layer tree parser plus converters.'}
{'en': 'Continuous Learning in Neural Machine Translation using Bilingual Dictionaries', 'pt': 'Aprendizado Contínuo em Tradução Automática Neural usando Dicionários Bilíngues', 'fr': "Formation continue en traduction automatique neuronale à l'aide de dictionnaires bilingues", 'ja': 'バイリンガル辞書を使用した神経機械翻訳における継続的学習', 'zh': '用双语词典神经机器翻译习之', 'ar': 'التعلم المستمر في الترجمة الآلية العصبية باستخدام القواميس ثنائية اللغة', 'es': 'Aprendizaje continuo en traducción automática neuronal mediante diccionarios bilingües', 'hi': 'द्विभाषी शब्दकोशों का उपयोग कर तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद में निरंतर सीखना', 'ru': 'Непрерывное обучение нейронному машинному переводу с использованием двуязычных словарей', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Leanúnach san Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarthach ag úsáid Foclóirí Dátheangacha', 'ka': 'ბილუნგიური სიტყვების გამოყენებით ნეიროლური მაქსინის გადასწავლებაში', 'it': 'Apprendimento continuo nella traduzione automatica neurale utilizzando dizionari bilingui', 'el': 'Συνεχής Μάθηση στη Νευρική Μηχανική Μετάφραση χρησιμοποιώντας Δίγλωσσα Λεκτικά', 'hu': 'Folyamatos tanulás idegi gépi fordításban kétnyelvű szótárak segítségével', 'ms': 'Pelajaran Terus dalam Terjemahan Mesin Neural menggunakan Kamus Bahasa', 'mk': 'Продолжување на учењето во превод на неврални машини користејќи двогласни речници', 'ml': 'ബിലിങ്കുള്\u200d നിഘണ്ടീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നെയുറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Tagħlim kontinwu fit-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni Newrali bl-użu ta’ Dikjatarji Bilingwi', 'mn': 'Хоёрдугаар үгсэлтэй ашиглан мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө дамжуулан суралцах', 'lt': 'Nuolatinis mokymasis versti nervines mašinas naudojant dvikalbius žodynus', 'ro': 'Învățarea continuă în traducerea automată neurală folosind dicționare bilingvă', 'pl': 'Ciągłe uczenie się w neuronowym tłumaczeniu maszynowym za pomocą dwujęzycznych słowników', 'no': 'Kontinuer læring i neuralmaskineomsetjing ved hjelp av bilete ordlister', 'sr': 'Neprestano učenje u Neuralnoj prevodi mašine koristeći dvostruke rečnike', 'so': 'Waxbarashada sii-socda ee machine neural turjumista isticmaalka luqada bilowga', 'sv': 'Kontinuerligt lärande i neural maskinöversättning med tvåspråkiga ordböcker', 'ta': 'Name', 'si': 'බිලින්ගුල් භාෂකයන් භාවිත කරන්න පුළුවන් නියම මැෂින් භාවිතයේ ඉගෙනගන්න', 'ur': 'دوئلینگ ٹیکلوری کے مطابق نیورال ماشین ترجمہ میں ادامه کی تعلیم', 'kk': 'Қосымша сөздіктерді қолдану үшін нейрондық машинаның аудармасында ұқсас беру', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học liên tục về cấu trúc thần kinh qua thuật tự tử', 'bg': 'Непрекъснато обучение по неврален машинен превод с двуезични речници', 'nl': 'Continue Leren in Neural Machine Translation met behulp van Tweetalige Woordenboeken', 'hr': 'Neprestano učenje u Neuralnoj prevodi strojeva koristeći dvostruke riječi', 'da': 'Kontinuerlig læring i neural maskinoversættelse ved hjælp af tosprogede ordbøger', 'de': 'Kontinuierliches Lernen in der neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung mit zweisprachigen Wörterbüchern', 'id': 'Selanjutnya Belajar dalam Translation Mesin Neural menggunakan Kamus Bahasa', 'ko': '이중 언어 사전 기반의 신경 기계 번역 중의 연속 학습', 'fa': 'یادگیری دائمی در ترجمه ماشین عصبی با استفاده از گفتگوهای دوگانه', 'sw': 'Kuendelea kujifunza katika Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Neural kwa kutumia Lugha za Kiingereza', 'tr': 'Näyral Maşynyň terjimesinde öwrenmek isleýän Täze sözleriň ullanýar', 'sq': 'Mësimi i vazhdueshëm në përkthimin e makinës nervore duke përdorur fjalorët dygjuhësorë', 'af': 'Ondeurtrekende leer in neurale masjien vertaling gebruik tweede woordeboeke', 'am': 'መግለጫ', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման շարունակական սովորելը երկլեզու բառարաններով', 'az': 'İkinci Sözlükləri istifadə edərək nöral maşına çevirilməsində həmişəlik öyrənmək', 'bn': 'বিলিঙ্গুয়েল অভিভাবক ব্যবহার করে নিউরাল মেশিনের অনুবাদ অনুবাদের মধ্যে শিক্ষা চলছে', 'bs': 'Neprestano učenje u Neuralnoj prevodi strojeva koristeći dvostruke rečnike', 'ca': "L'aprenentatge continu en la traducció de màquines neurals utilitzant diccionaris bilingues", 'cs': 'Kontinuální učení v neuronovém strojovém překladu pomocí dvojjazyčných slovníků', 'et': 'Pidev õppimine neuroaalses masintõlkes kahekeelsete sõnaraamatute abil', 'fi': 'Jatkuva oppiminen hermojen konekäännöksessä kaksikielisten sanakirjojen avulla', 'jv': 'Tulung Jejaring', 'he': 'ללמוד ממשיך בתרגום מכונות נוירות בשימוש במילונים משולשים', 'sk': 'Stalno učenje v nevralnem strojnem prevajanju z dvojezičnimi slovarji', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'རྒྱུན་ལྡན་པའི་འཇུག་རྟེན་འདིའི་སྒེར་གྱི་ལག་འཁོར་གྱི་སྐད་བསྒྱུར་བར་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པའི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ།'}
{'en': 'While recent advances in deep learning led to significant improvements in machine translation, neural machine translation is often still not able to continuously adapt to the environment. For humans, as well as for machine translation, bilingual dictionaries are a promising knowledge source to continuously integrate new knowledge. However, their exploitation poses several challenges : The system needs to be able to perform one-shot learning as well as model the morphology of source and target language. In this work, we proposed an evaluation framework to assess the ability of neural machine translation to continuously learn new phrases. We integrate one-shot learning methods for neural machine translation with different word representations and show that it is important to address both in order to successfully make use of bilingual dictionaries. By addressing both challenges we are able to improve the ability to translate new, rare words and phrases from 30 % to up to 70 %. The correct lemma is even generated by more than 90 %.', 'ar': 'بينما أدت التطورات الحديثة في التعلم العميق إلى تحسينات كبيرة في الترجمة الآلية ، إلا أن الترجمة الآلية العصبية غالبًا ما تكون غير قادرة على التكيف باستمرار مع البيئة. بالنسبة للبشر ، وكذلك للترجمة الآلية ، تعد القواميس ثنائية اللغة مصدر معرفة واعدًا لدمج المعرفة الجديدة باستمرار. ومع ذلك ، فإن استغلالهم يفرض العديد من التحديات: يحتاج النظام إلى أن يكون قادرًا على أداء التعلم دفعة واحدة بالإضافة إلى نمذجة مورفولوجيا اللغة المصدر والهدف. في هذا العمل ، اقترحنا إطار عمل تقييمي لتقييم قدرة الترجمة الآلية العصبية على التعلم المستمر للعبارات الجديدة. نحن ندمج طرق التعلم أحادية الطور للترجمة الآلية العصبية مع تمثيلات مختلفة للكلمات ونبين أنه من المهم معالجة كليهما من أجل الاستفادة بنجاح من القواميس ثنائية اللغة. من خلال معالجة كلا التحديين ، يمكننا تحسين القدرة على ترجمة الكلمات والعبارات الجديدة والنادرة من 30٪ إلى 70٪. يتم إنشاء اللمة الصحيحة حتى بأكثر من 90٪.', 'pt': 'Embora os avanços recentes no aprendizado profundo tenham levado a melhorias significativas na tradução automática, a tradução automática neural muitas vezes ainda não é capaz de se adaptar continuamente ao ambiente. Para os humanos, assim como para a tradução automática, os dicionários bilíngues são uma fonte de conhecimento promissora para integrar continuamente novos conhecimentos. No entanto, sua exploração apresenta vários desafios: O sistema precisa ser capaz de realizar o aprendizado one-shot, bem como modelar a morfologia do idioma de origem e de destino. Neste trabalho, propusemos uma estrutura de avaliação para avaliar a capacidade da tradução automática neural de aprender continuamente novas frases. Integramos métodos de aprendizado one-shot para tradução automática neural com diferentes representações de palavras e mostramos que é importante abordar ambos para fazer uso de dicionários bilíngues com sucesso. Ao abordar ambos os desafios, podemos melhorar a capacidade de traduzir palavras e frases novas e raras de 30% para até 70%. O lema correto é gerado em mais de 90%.', 'fr': "Alors que les récentes avancées en matière d'apprentissage profond ont entraîné des améliorations significatives de la traduction automatique, la traduction automatique neuronale n'est souvent toujours pas capable de s'adapter en permanence à l'environnement. Pour les humains, ainsi que pour la traduction automatique, les dictionnaires bilingues sont une source de connaissances prometteuse pour intégrer en permanence de nouvelles connaissances. Cependant, leur exploitation pose plusieurs défis\xa0: le système doit être capable d'effectuer un apprentissage ponctuel et de modéliser la morphologie de la langue source et de la langue cible. Dans ce travail, nous avons proposé un cadre d'évaluation pour évaluer la capacité de la traduction automatique neuronale à apprendre continuellement de nouvelles phrases. Nous intégrons des méthodes d'apprentissage ponctuelles pour la traduction automatique neuronale avec différentes représentations de mots et montrons qu'il est important de traiter les deux afin d'utiliser avec succès les dictionnaires bilingues. En relevant ces deux défis, nous sommes en mesure d'améliorer la capacité à traduire de 30\xa0% à 70\xa0% de nouveaux mots et phrases rares. Le lemme correct est même généré à plus de 90%.", 'es': 'Si bien los avances recientes en el aprendizaje profundo han llevado a mejoras significativas en la traducción automática, la traducción automática neuronal a menudo no puede adaptarse continuamente al entorno. Para los seres humanos, así como para la traducción automática, los diccionarios bilingües son una fuente de conocimiento prometedora para integrar continuamente nuevos conocimientos. Sin embargo, su explotación plantea varios desafíos: el sistema debe ser capaz de realizar un aprendizaje único, así como modelar la morfología del idioma de origen y de destino. En este trabajo, propusimos un marco de evaluación para evaluar la capacidad de la traducción automática neuronal para aprender nuevas frases continuamente. Integramos métodos de aprendizaje único para la traducción automática neuronal con diferentes representaciones de palabras y demostramos que es importante abordar ambos para utilizar con éxito los diccionarios bilingües. Al abordar ambos desafíos, podemos mejorar la capacidad de traducir palabras y frases nuevas y raras del 30% al 70%. El lema correcto se genera incluso en más del 90%.', 'ja': 'ディープラーニングの最近の進歩は、機械翻訳の大幅な改善につながったが、ニューラル機械翻訳は、多くの場合、環境に継続的に適応することができない。 人間にとっても、機械翻訳にとっても、バイリンガル辞書は、新しい知識を継続的に統合するための有望な知識源です。 しかし、それらの利用にはいくつかの課題があります。システムは、ソース言語とターゲット言語の形態をモデル化するだけでなく、単発学習を実行できる必要があります。 本研究では、継続的に新しいフレーズを学習するためのニューラル機械翻訳の能力を評価するための評価フレームワークを提案した。 異なる単語表現を持つニューラル機械翻訳のためのワンショット学習方法を統合し、バイリンガル辞書をうまく利用するためには両方に対処することが重要であることを示しています。 両方の課題に対処することで、新しい珍しい単語やフレーズを30%から最大70%まで翻訳する能力を向上させることができます。 正しいレンマは、90%以上生成されます。', 'zh': '虽深学之最新进展致机器翻译显改,而神经机器翻译常不能应也。 人之于机器翻译,双语词典不绝整合新知之所由来也。 然其利用挑战者数人:统须能行一次性学及对源语言语言之形建模。 于此之中,立一评估框架以质神经机器翻译新短语之能。 吾将神经机器翻译之一次性学与众单词合,明用双语词典,二者为重也。 以此二者挑战,能以译新之奇单词与短语之力自30%至于70%。 正引理至生过90%。', 'hi': 'जबकि गहरी शिक्षा में हाल की प्रगति ने मशीन अनुवाद में महत्वपूर्ण सुधार किया, तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद अक्सर अभी भी पर्यावरण के अनुकूल होने में सक्षम नहीं है। मनुष्यों के लिए, साथ ही मशीन अनुवाद के लिए, द्विभाषी शब्दकोश लगातार नए ज्ञान को एकीकृत करने के लिए एक आशाजनक ज्ञान स्रोत हैं। हालांकि, उनका शोषण कई चुनौतियों का सामना करता है: सिस्टम को एक-शॉट सीखने के साथ-साथ स्रोत और लक्ष्य भाषा की आकृति विज्ञान को मॉडल करने में सक्षम होने की आवश्यकता है। इस काम में, हमने लगातार नए वाक्यांशों को सीखने के लिए तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद की क्षमता का आकलन करने के लिए एक मूल्यांकन ढांचे का प्रस्ताव दिया। हम विभिन्न शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व के साथ तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के लिए एक-शॉट सीखने के तरीकों को एकीकृत करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि द्विभाषी शब्दकोशों का सफलतापूर्वक उपयोग करने के लिए दोनों को संबोधित करना महत्वपूर्ण है। दोनों चुनौतियों को संबोधित करके हम नए, दुर्लभ शब्दों और वाक्यांशों को 30% से 70% तक अनुवाद करने की क्षमता में सुधार करने में सक्षम हैं। सही लेमा भी 90% से अधिक द्वारा उत्पन्न होता है।', 'ru': 'В то время как недавние достижения в области глубокого обучения привели к значительным улучшениям в машинном переводе, нейронный машинный перевод часто все еще не в состоянии постоянно адаптироваться к окружающей среде. Для людей, а также для машинного перевода двуязычные словари являются многообещающим источником знаний для непрерывной интеграции новых знаний. Однако их использование сопряжено с рядом проблем: система должна быть в состоянии выполнять одноразовое обучение, а также моделировать морфологию исходного и целевого языка. В этой работе мы предложили структуру оценки для оценки способности нейронного машинного перевода непрерывно изучать новые фразы. Мы интегрируем методы одномоментного обучения для нейронного машинного перевода с различными представлениями слов и показываем, что важно рассмотреть оба вопроса, чтобы успешно использовать двуязычные словари. Решая обе задачи, мы можем улучшить способность переводить новые, редкие слова и фразы с 30% до 70%. Правильная лемма даже генерируется более чем на 90%.', 'ga': 'Cé gur tháinig feabhsuithe suntasacha ar an meaisínaistriúchán mar gheall ar dhul chun cinn le déanaí san fhoghlaim dhomhain, is minic nach mbíonn an meaisínaistriúchán néaránach in ann oiriúnú go leanúnach don timpeallacht. Do dhaoine, chomh maith le haistriúchán meaisín, is foinse eolais dóchasach iad foclóirí dátheangacha chun eolas nua a chomhtháthú go leanúnach. Mar sin féin, cruthaíonn a ndúshaothrú go leor dúshlán: Ní mór don chóras a bheith in ann foghlaim aonuaire a dhéanamh chomh maith le deilbhíocht na teanga foinse agus na sprioctheanga a shamhaltú. San obair seo, mholamar creat meastóireachta chun measúnú a dhéanamh ar chumas an mheaisínaistriúcháin néaraigh chun frásaí nua a fhoghlaim go leanúnach. Comhtháthaimid modhanna foghlama aonuaire le haghaidh aistriúchán meaisín néarach le léirithe éagsúla focal agus léirímid go bhfuil sé tábhachtach aghaidh a thabhairt ar an dá cheann chun úsáid rathúil a bhaint as foclóirí dátheangacha. Trí dhul i ngleic leis an dá dhúshlán is féidir linn ár gcumas focail agus frásaí nua neamhchoitianta a aistriú a fheabhsú ó 30% go 70%. Gintear an lema ceart fiú níos mó ná 90%.', 'ka': 'მაგრამ ახლა ძალიან სწავლების წინასწარმატებითი წინასწარმატებით მაქსინური წარმატებით გააკეთება, ნეიროლური მაქსინური წარმატებით არ შეუძლებელია გა ადამიანებისთვის და მანქანის გაგრძელებისთვის, ორიენგური სიტყვები უნდა იყოს ცნობიერი გამოსახულებელი, რომელიც ახალი ცნობილების შემდეგ ინტეგრაცია. მაგრამ, ისინი ექსპლუტაცია უნდა გავაკეთოთ რამდენიმე განცემები: სისტემა უნდა შეუძლებელია ერთი სტატის სწავლების შესაძლებლობა და მოდელური მსოფლიოგია და მი ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ მივიღეთ გავამუშაოთ გავამუშაოთ ნეიროლური მანქანის გადაწყვეტილების შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც შემდეგ ახალი ფრაზების გასწავ ჩვენ ერთი სტრიქტის სწავლების მეტოვების ინტერგურაცია ნეიროლური მანქანის გარგულისხმებისთვის განსხვავებული სიტყვების გარგულისხმებით და გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ეს მნიშვნელოვანია ორ ჩვენ შეგვიძლია ახალი, ცოტა სიტყვები და სიტყვები 30%-დან 70%-დან გადავიწყოთ. მარტივი ლემია 90% უფრო მეტი იქნება.', 'hu': 'Míg a mélytanulás terén a közelmúltbeli fejlődés jelentős javulást eredményezett a gépi fordítás terén, az idegi gépi fordítás gyakran még mindig nem képes folyamatosan alkalmazkodni a környezethez. Az emberek, valamint a gépi fordítás számára a kétnyelvű szótárak ígéretes tudásforrást jelentenek az új ismeretek folyamatos integrálására. Kihasználásuk azonban számos kihívást jelent: a rendszernek képesnek kell lennie arra, hogy egyszeri tanulást végezzen, valamint modellezze a forrás- és célnyelv morfológiáját. Ebben a munkában egy értékelési keretrendszert javasoltunk annak értékelésére, hogy az idegi gépi fordítás képes-e folyamatosan új kifejezéseket tanulni. Integráljuk az idegi gépi fordításhoz szükséges egyszeri tanulási módszereket különböző szóreprezentációkkal, és megmutatjuk, hogy fontos mindkettővel foglalkozni a kétnyelvű szótárak sikeres használata érdekében. Mindkét kihívás kezelésével 30%-ról 70%-ig javíthatjuk az új ritka szavak és kifejezések fordításának képességét. A megfelelő lemma még több mint 90% -kal is generálódik.', 'kk': 'Жуырдағы түсінікті оқыту жағдайлары машинаның аудармасында маңызды жақсартылғанда, невралдық машинаның аудармасы көбінде ортаға әрқашанда қолдануға болмайды. Адамдар үшін, және машинаны аудару үшін, екі тіл сөздері жаңа білімдерді жалғастыру үшін білім көзі болады. Бірақ олардың жұмыс істеу бірнеше мәселелерді көрсетеді: жүйе бір түрлі оқыту және көзі мен мақсатты тілдің морфологиясының үлгісін жасау керек. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, жаңа сөздерді үйрену үшін неврал машинаның аудару мүмкіндігін оқу үшін оқу бағдарламасын ұсындық. Біз невралдық компьютердің аудармаларының бір түрлі оқыту әдістерін түрлі сөздердің түрінде біріктіріп, екі тілді сөздерді сәтті қолдану үшін, екеуінің адресті жасау үшін маңызды Екі мәселелерді шешу арқылы, біз жаңа, қызық сөздер мен сөздерді 30% ден 70% деп аударуға мүмкіндік бере аламыз. Дұрыс лимма 90% ден артық құрылады.', 'el': 'Ενώ οι πρόσφατες εξελίξεις στη βαθιά μάθηση οδήγησαν σε σημαντικές βελτιώσεις στη μηχανική μετάφραση, η νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση συχνά δεν είναι σε θέση να προσαρμοστεί συνεχώς στο περιβάλλον. Για τους ανθρώπους, καθώς και για τη μηχανική μετάφραση, τα δίγλωσσα λεξικά είναι μια ελπιδοφόρα πηγή γνώσης για την συνεχή ενσωμάτωση νέων γνώσεων. Ωστόσο, η αξιοποίηση τους θέτει αρκετές προκλήσεις: Το σύστημα πρέπει να είναι σε θέση να εκτελεί μονοφωνική μάθηση καθώς και να μοντελοποιεί τη μορφολογία της γλώσσας προέλευσης και στόχου. Στην εργασία αυτή, προτείναμε ένα πλαίσιο αξιολόγησης για την αξιολόγηση της ικανότητας της νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης να μαθαίνει συνεχώς νέες φράσεις. Ενσωματώνουμε μεθόδους εκμάθησης για τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση με διαφορετικές αναπαραστάσεις λέξεων και δείχνουν ότι είναι σημαντικό να αντιμετωπιστούν και οι δύο προκειμένου να χρησιμοποιηθούν επιτυχώς δίγλωσσα λεξικά. Αντιμετωπίζοντας και τις δύο προκλήσεις είμαστε σε θέση να βελτιώσουμε την ικανότητα μετάφρασης νέων, σπάνιων λέξεων και φράσεων από 30% έως 70%. Το σωστό λέμμα παράγεται ακόμη και κατά περισσότερο από 90%.', 'lt': 'Nors pastarojo meto gilaus mokymosi pažanga labai pagerino mašin ų vertimą, nervinių mašinų vertimas dažnai vis dar negali nuolat prisitaikyti prie aplinkos. Žmonėms ir vertimui mašinomis dvikalbiai žodynai yra žadantis žinių šaltinis nuolat integruoti naujas žinias. Tačiau jų naudojimas kelia keletą iššūkių: sistema turi sugebėti atlikti vienkartinį mokymąsi ir modeliuoti šaltinio ir tikslinės kalbos morfologiją. Šiame darbe pasiūlėme vertinimo sistemą, skirtą įvertinti nervinių mašinų vertimo gebėjimą nuolat mokytis naujų frazių. Mes integruojame vienkartinius mokymosi metodus nerviniam mašin ų vertimui su skirtingais žodžių rodymais ir rodome, kad svarbu spręsti abu klausimus, kad sėkmingai būtų naudojami dvikalbiai žodynai. Atsižvelgdami į abu iššūkius galime pagerinti gebėjimą išversti naujus retus žodžius ir frazes nuo 30 % iki 70 %. Tinkama citrinos gamyba net sudaro daugiau kaip 90 proc.', 'mk': 'Иако неодамнешните напредоци во длабоко учење доведоа до значителни подобрувања во машинскиот превод, нервниот машински превод честопати сé уште не е во можност континуирано да се адаптира на околината. За луѓето, како и за машински превод, двојјазичните речници се ветувачки извор на знаење за постојано интегрирање на ново знаење. Сепак, нивната експлоатација претставува неколку предизвици: системот мора да биде во можност да изврши едноshot учење, како и да ја модели морфологијата на изворот и јазикот на целта. In this work, we proposed an evaluation framework to assess the ability of neural machine translation to continuously learn new phrases.  We integrate one-shot learning methods for neural machine translation with different word representations and show that it is important to address both in order to successfully make use of bilingual dictionaries.  By addressing both challenges we are able to improve the ability to translate new, rare words and phrases from 30% to up to 70%.  Точната лима дури и се генерира за повеќе од 90 отсто.', 'it': "Mentre i recenti progressi nel deep learning hanno portato a miglioramenti significativi nella traduzione automatica, la traduzione automatica neurale spesso non è ancora in grado di adattarsi continuamente all'ambiente. Per gli esseri umani, così come per la traduzione automatica, i dizionari bilingui sono una fonte di conoscenza promettente per integrare continuamente nuove conoscenze. Tuttavia, il loro sfruttamento pone diverse sfide: il sistema deve essere in grado di eseguire un apprendimento one-shot e modellare la morfologia della lingua di origine e di destinazione. In questo lavoro, abbiamo proposto un framework di valutazione per valutare la capacità della traduzione automatica neurale di imparare continuamente nuove frasi. Integriamo metodi di apprendimento one-shot per la traduzione automatica neurale con diverse rappresentazioni di parole e mostriamo che è importante affrontare entrambi al fine di utilizzare con successo dizionari bilingui. Affrontando entrambe le sfide siamo in grado di migliorare la capacità di tradurre parole e frasi nuove e rare dal 30% al 70%. Il lemma corretto è addirittura generato da oltre il 90%.", 'ms': 'Sementara kemajuan belakangan ini dalam pembelajaran mendalam menyebabkan peningkatan yang signifikan dalam terjemahan mesin, terjemahan mesin saraf sering masih tidak mampu secara terus menerus menyesuaikan kepada persekitaran. Untuk manusia, serta untuk terjemahan mesin, kamus dua bahasa adalah sumber pengetahuan yang berjanji untuk mengintegrasikan pengetahuan baru secara terus menerus. Namun, eksploitasi mereka menghasilkan beberapa cabaran: Sistem perlu mampu melakukan pembelajaran satu-shot serta model morfologi sumber dan bahasa sasaran. Dalam kerja ini, kami melamar kerangka penilaian untuk menilai kemampuan terjemahan mesin saraf untuk terus-menerus belajar frasa baru. Kami mengintegrasikan kaedah pembelajaran satu-shot untuk terjemahan mesin saraf dengan perwakilan perkataan yang berbeza dan menunjukkan bahawa penting untuk mengatasi kedua-dua untuk berjaya menggunakan kamus dua bahasa. Dengan mengatasi kedua-dua cabaran kita mampu meningkatkan kemampuan untuk menerjemahkan perkataan dan frasa baru, langka dari 30% hingga 70%. Lema yang betul juga dijana dengan lebih dari 90%.', 'mn': 'Гүн гүнзгий суралцах саяхан хөгжлийн давхар нь машины хөгжлийн хувьд машины хөгжлийн сайхан сайхан хөгжлийн үр дүнд мэдрэлийн машины хөгжлийн хөгжлийг ихэвчлэн ор Хүн төрөлхтний хувьд, мөн машины орчуулалтын хувьд хоёр хэл үг үг нь шинэ мэдлэгийг үргэлж нэгтгэх ухааны эх үүсвэр юм. Гэвч тэдний ашиглах нь олон сорилтуудыг бий болгодог: систем нь нэг шалтгаан суралцах болон эх үүсвэрийн, зорилготой хэлний морфологийг загварчлах хэрэгтэй. Энэ ажлын тулд бид мэдрэлийн машин хөрөнгө оруулах чадварыг үргэлж шинэ хэлбэрүүдийг сурах боломжтой үнэлэх хэмжээг санал болгосон. Бид мэдрэлийн машины орчуулалтын нэг шалтгаан суралцах аргыг өөр үг илэрхийлэлтэй нэгтгэдэг. Хоёр хэл үгийг амжилттай ашиглах нь хоёр дахь тухай ярилцах нь чухал гэдгийг харуулж байна. Хоёр сорилтуудыг тусалд бид шинэ, ховор үг, өгүүлбэрийг 30% ээс 70% хүртэл орлуулах чадварыг сайжруулж чадна. Зөв лимма нь 90% аас илүү үүсгэгддэг.', 'mt': 'While recent advances in deep learning led to significant improvements in machine translation, neural machine translation is often still not able to continuously adapt to the environment.  Għall-bnedmin, kif ukoll għat-traduzzjoni bil-magna, id-dikjararji billingwi huma sors ta’ għarfien promettenti biex jintegraw kontinwament għarfien ġdid. Madankollu, l-isfruttament tagħhom joħloq diversi sfidi: Is-sistema trid tkun tista’ tagħmel tagħlim b’darba kif ukoll timmudella l-morfoloġija tas-sors u l-lingwa fil-mira. F’dan ix-xogħol, ipproponejna qafas ta’ evalwazzjoni biex tivvaluta l-kapaċità tat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali li jitgħallmu b’mod kontinwu frażijiet ġodda. Aħna nintegraw metodi ta’ tagħlim b’darba għat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali b’rappreżentazzjonijiet differenti tal-kliem u nuru li huwa importanti li nindirizzaw it-tnejn sabiex isir użu b’suċċess tad-dikjaraturi bilngwi. Billi nindirizzaw iż-żewġ sfidi, nistgħu ntejbu l-kapaċità li nittraduċu kliem u frażijiet ġodda u rari minn 30% sa 70%. Il-limma korretta hija ġġenerata anke b’aktar minn 90 %.', 'ml': 'അടുത്തിടെയുള്ള വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിലുള്ള പുരോഗങ്ങള്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷത്തില്\u200d വലിയ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. പ്രാവശ്യം  മനുഷ്യര്\u200dക്ക്, മെഷിന്\u200d പരിഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കും രണ്ടു ഭാഷക്കാരുടെ നിഘണ്ടുകള്\u200d പുതിയ അറിവുകള്\u200d ഒരു പ്രത്യേകമായ അറിവുകളുടെ സ്ര എന്നാലും അവരുടെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് പല വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുമുണ്ട്: സിസ്റ്റത്തിന് ഒരു ഷോട്ട് പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നതും സോര്\u200d ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d പുതിയ വാക്കുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കാന്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷണത്തിന്റെ കഴിവിനെ പരിഗണിക് ന്യൂറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷയ്ക്കുള്ള ഒരു ഷോട്ട് പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് നമ്മള രണ്ടു വാക്കുകളെയും വിലാസങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിച്ചാല്\u200d പുതിയ വാക്കുകളെയും വാക്കുകളെയും പരിശോധിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d നമ ശരിയായ ലെമ്മാ പോലും 90 ശതമാനത്തിനു കൂടുതല്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു.', 'pl': 'Podczas gdy ostatnie postępy w zakresie głębokiego uczenia doprowadziły do znaczącej poprawy w zakresie tłumaczenia maszynowego, neuronowe tłumaczenie maszynowe często nie jest w stanie ciągle dostosowywać się do otoczenia. Dla ludzi, jak również dla tłumaczeń maszynowych, dwujęzyczne słowniki są obiecującym źródłem wiedzy do ciągłej integracji nowej wiedzy. Jednak ich wykorzystanie wiąże się z kilkoma wyzwaniami: system musi być w stanie przeprowadzić naukę jednorazową oraz modelować morfologię języka źródłowego i docelowego. W niniejszej pracy zaproponowaliśmy ramy oceny zdolności neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego do ciągłego uczenia się nowych zwrotów. Integrujemy jednorazowe metody uczenia się neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego z różnymi reprezentacjami słów i pokazujemy, że ważne jest, aby z powodzeniem korzystać z dwujęzycznych słowników. Rozwiązując oba wyzwania, jesteśmy w stanie poprawić umiejętność tłumaczenia nowych, rzadkich słów i zwrotów od 30% do 70%. Prawidłowy lemma jest generowany nawet o ponad 90%.', 'no': 'Mens det siste avanserte i dypt læring førte til signifikante forbedringar i maskinsomsetjinga, er det ofte ikkje i stand til å tilpassa miljøet. For menneske, også for maskinsomsetjing, er bilingbokstavar eit promiserende kjelde for kunnskap å kontinuerleg integrere nye kunnskap. Dette ekspluatasjonen gjer imidlertid fleire utfordringar: Systemet må vera i stand til å utføra ein liten læring og modellen morfologien av kjeldespråk og målspråk. I denne arbeiden foreslåde vi eit evalueringsrammeverk for å vurdere kapasiteten for omsetjing av neuralmaskin for å lære nye frasar kontinuerleg. Vi integrerer ein liten læringsmetodar for å omsetja neuralmaskin med ulike ordrepresentasjonar og viser at det er viktig å adressa begge for å vellykke bruka av bilingbokstavar. Ved å handtere begge utfordringar kan vi forbetra kapasiteten for å oversette nye, rare ord og frasar frå 30% til 70%. Den rette lemma er til og med meir enn 90%.', 'so': 'Intii la soo dhowaaday horumarinta waxbarashada aad u dheer, waxaa la keenay hagaajinta tarjumaadda machine-ka, tarjumaadka maskinada xilliga badan weli ma awoodi karo mid ku habboon badnaanta. Maxaa yeelay, dadka iyo sidoo kale tarjumidda machineedku waa luqadaha labada luqadood oo aqoonta la ballanqaaday si ay aqoonta cusub u wada qabsadaan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee isticmaalkoodu waxay leedahay dhibaatooyin badan: nidaamka waa in uu awoodo inuu sameeyo waxbarasho hal toog ah iyo sidoo kale tusaale ahaan muuqashada asalka iyo luqada waxqabadka. Markaas waxan, waxaynu horumarinnay shuruudo qiimeynta si aan u qiimeynayno awoodda tarjumaadda maskinada neurada si aad u sii barto hadal cusub. Waxbarashada hal iskuul ah ayaannu u soo bandhignaa tarjumaadda maskaxda neurada, waxaana tusnaa in waa muhiim in labadooda looga hadlo si aad ugu liibaano isticmaalka luqadaha labada luqadood. Markaas ayaannu kala hadalno labada dhibaatooyin, waan awoodi karnaa inuu horumariyo awoodda aan ku turjumno hadal cusub, daahir ah iyo hadal, 30 boqolkiiba ilaa 70 boqolkiiba. Lambarka saxda ah waxaa xittaa lagu abuuraa in ka badan 90 boqolkiiba.', 'sv': 'Medan de senaste framstegen inom djupinlärning ledde till betydande förbättringar av maskinöversättning, kan neural maskinöversättning ofta fortfarande inte kontinuerligt anpassa sig till miljön. För människor, liksom för maskinöversättning, är tvåspråkiga ordböcker en lovande kunskapskälla för att kontinuerligt integrera ny kunskap. Utnyttjandet av dessa innebär dock flera utmaningar: Systemet måste kunna utföra engångsinlärning samt modellera käll- och målspråkets morfologi. I detta arbete föreslog vi ett utvärderingsram för att bedöma förmågan hos neural maskinöversättning att kontinuerligt lära sig nya fraser. Vi integrerar one-shot inlärningsmetoder för neural maskinöversättning med olika ordrepresentationer och visar att det är viktigt att ta itu med båda för att framgångsrikt kunna använda tvåspråkiga ordböcker. Genom att ta itu med båda utmaningarna kan vi förbättra förmågan att översätta nya, sällsynta ord och fraser från 30% till upp till 70%. Rätt lemma genereras till och med av mer än 90%.', 'ro': 'În timp ce progresele recente în domeniul învățării profunde au dus la îmbunătățiri semnificative în traducerea automată, traducerea automată neurală adesea nu este încă capabilă să se adapteze continuu la mediul înconjurător. Pentru oameni, precum și pentru traducerea automată, dicționarele bilingve reprezintă o sursă promițătoare de cunoștințe pentru integrarea continuă a noilor cunoștințe. Cu toate acestea, exploatarea lor reprezintă mai multe provocări: sistemul trebuie să fie capabil să efectueze învățare unică, precum și să modeleze morfologia limbii sursă și a limbii țintă. În această lucrare, am propus un cadru de evaluare pentru a evalua capacitatea traducerii automate neurale de a învăța continuu noi fraze. Integrăm metode de învățare unică pentru traducerea automată neurală cu diferite reprezentări de cuvinte și arătăm că este important să abordăm ambele pentru a utiliza cu succes dicționarele bilingve. Prin abordarea ambelor provocări, suntem capabili să îmbunătățim capacitatea de a traduce cuvinte și fraze noi, rare, de la 30% până la 70%. Lemma corectă este chiar generată de peste 90%.', 'ta': 'While recent advances in deep learning led to significant improvements in machine translation, neural machine translation is often still not able to continuously adapt to the environment.  For humans, as well as for machine translation, bilingual dictionaries are a promising knowledge source to continuously integrate new knowledge.  ஆயினும், அவர்களின் பயன்பாடு பல சவால்கள் கொண்டுள்ளது: கணினியில் ஒரு சுட்டி கற்றுக்கொள்ள வேண்டும் மற்றும் மூலத்தின் மொழியின்  இந்த வேலையில், நாங்கள் புதிய சொற்றொடர்களை தொடர்ந்து கற்றுக் கொள்ள ஒரு மதிப்பீடு சட்டத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். நாம் புதிய இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிமாற்ற மொழிமாற்ற முறைகளை ஒன்று சேர்க்க முறைமைகளை வெற்றிகரமாக இரு மொழிகளை பயன்படுத்துவதற்கு வெற்றி இரண்டு சவால்களையும் சேர்த்தால், புதிய, சிறிய வார்த்தைகளையும், மொழிகளையும் மொழிபெயர்த்த முடியும். சரியான லிம்மா 90% க்கு மேற்பட்டுள்ளது.', 'ur': 'جبکہ عمیق تعلیم میں اچھی پیشرفت کی وجہ سے ماشین ترجمہ میں بہت اچھی تغییرات کی وجہ سے ہوتی ہے، نورول ماشین ترجمہ اکثر اکثر وہاں محیط کے ساتھ ہمیشہ قادر نہیں ہے۔ انسانوں کے لئے، اور ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے، دو زبان کلمات کا ایک وعدہ دینے والی علم سورج ہے کہ نئی علم کو دائمی ترجمہ کرے۔ لیکن ان کی استعمال بہت سی چالوں کی وجہ سے ہوتی ہے: سیسٹم کی ضرورت ہے کہ ایک شٹ کی تعلیم کرسکے اور منبع اور موجود زبان کی مدل کرسکے۔ ہم نے اس کام میں ایک ارزیابی فرم کی پیشنهاد کی کہ نئورل ماشین ترجمہ کے قابلیت کی ارزیابی کریں اور نئی فرض سکھائیں۔ ہم ایک شٹ کی تعلیم طریقے کو نیورل ماشین کی ترجمہ کے لئے مختلف کلمات کی تعلیم کے ساتھ جمع کرتے ہیں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ دونوں باتوں کے ساتھ موفقیت کے ساتھ استعمال کرنے کے لئے اہم ہے۔ دونوں چالوں کے بارے میں ہم نیا، نادر کلمات اور کلمات کو 30% سے 70% تک ترجمہ کرنے کے قابل تدبیر کر سکتے ہیں۔ سیدھی لیمیا 90% سے زیادہ پیدا کیا گیا ہے۔', 'sr': 'Iako nedavni napredak u dubokom učenju doveo je do značajnih poboljšanja u prevodu mašine, prevod neuronskih mašina često se i dalje ne može stalno prilagoditi okolišu. Za ljude, kao i za prevod mašine, dvojezički rečenici su obećavajući izvor znanja koji će stalno integrirati nove znanje. Međutim, njihova ekspluatacija predstavlja nekoliko izazova: sistem mora biti u stanju da izvede učenje jedne šanse, kao i model morfologije izvora i ciljnog jezika. U ovom poslu smo predložili okvir za procjenu sposobnosti prevoda neuralne mašine da nastavi naučiti nove rečenice. Integrujemo metode učenja jednostruke za prevod neuralne mašine sa različitim predstavljanjem riječi i pokažemo da je važno obraćati se oboje kako bi uspešno iskoristili dvojezičke reči. Kada se riješimo obe izazove, možemo poboljšati sposobnost da prevedemo nove, retke reči i rečenice od 30% do 70%. Prava limuna je èak stvorena više od 90%.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න අලුත් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙන්නේ මැෂින් වාර්ථාවයේ වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි කරලා තියෙන්නේ, න්\u200dයුරෝල් ම මිනිස්සු වෙනුවෙන්, ඒ වගේම මැෂින් වාර්ථාපනය වෙනුවෙන්, දෙවල් භාෂාවක් භාෂාවක් තමයි ප්\u200dරාර්ථ නමුත්, ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විතරයි අභ්\u200dයාගයක් විතරයි: පද්ධතිය එක්ක ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා, ඒ මේ වැඩේ අපි අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාසයක් ප්\u200dරාර්ථනා කරනවා අලුත් වචනයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න න්\u200dයූරාල් මැෂින් අවශ්\u200dය වි අපි වෙනස් වචන ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සඳහා එක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් කරන්න පුළුවන් කි අපිට ප්\u200dරශ්න දෙන්නම ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්න වෙන්න පුළුවන් අළුත්, ප්\u200dරශ්න වචනය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්න වචනය 30% වෙන හරි ලෙම්මාවත් 90% වඩා වැඩියි.', 'uz': "Yaqinda o'rganish muvaffaqiyatlarini mashina tarjima qilishga juda muhim yaxshi o'zgarishga sabab beradi, har doim kerakli maskina tarjima qilishi davom etilmaydi. Insonlar uchun, mashina tarjima qilish uchun ikki tillar lugʻatlari davomida yangi ilmiyni birlashtirish uchun yaxshi ilmiy manbasi. Lekin ularning foydalanishi bir necha muammolar bo'ladi: Tizim bir marta o'rganishni bajarishi kerak va yani manba va hozir tillarining morfologiyasini modelini bajarishi kerak. Bu ishda biz yangi imkoniyatlarni davomida o'rganish uchun neyrol maskining tarjimalarining imkoniyatini qiymatlashni talab qildik. Biz bir tashqi o'rganish usullarini birlashtiramiz va boshqa so'zlar tashkilotlari bilan bir so'zlar tarjimalarini birlashtiramiz va ikkita lugʻatlarga muvaffaqiyatli ishlatish uchun ikkita lugʻatlardan foydalanish muhim. Bu ikkita muammolarni o'zgartirish orqali biz yangi, nadiq so'zlar va bir so'zlarni 30% dan 70% dan ko'p so'zlarni tarjima qilish imkoniyatini oshirish mumkin. Xato lema 90% dan ortiq yaratiladi.", 'vi': 'Trong khi những bước tiến gần đây trong việc học sâu dẫn đến cải tiến đáng kể trong việc dịch chuyển cỗ máy, dịch chuyển thiết bị thần kinh vẫn thường không thể liên tục thích nghi với môi trường. Đối với con người, cũng như dịch chuyển máy, từ điển hai ngôn ngữ là một nguồn kiến thức hứa hẹn để liên tục nhập vào kiến thức mới. Tuy nhiên, sự khai thác của họ tạo ra nhiều thử thách. Hệ thống cần phải có khả năng học một phát, cũng như mô tả độ trưng của ngôn ngữ nguồn và mục tiêu. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề xuất một bộ phận đánh giá để đánh giá khả năng dịch dịch biến máy thần kinh liên tục học những cụm từ mới. Chúng tôi nhập vào phương pháp học một phát để dịch thiết bị thần kinh bằng các từ khác nhau và cho thấy rằng rất quan trọng để thực hiện cả hai để có thể sử dụng các từ điển hai thứ tự. Bằng cách giải quyết cả hai thử thách, chúng ta có thể cải thiện khả năng dịch từ ngữ và cụm từ mới, hiếm từ 97-up 70Name Chính xác là loại vượn này còn tạo ra hơn 90.', 'bg': 'Докато скорошният напредък в дълбокото обучение доведе до значителни подобрения в машинния превод, невронният машинен превод често все още не е в състояние непрекъснато да се адаптира към околната среда. За хората, както и за машинния превод, двуезичните речници са обещаващ източник на знания за непрекъснато интегриране на нови знания. Използването им обаче поставя няколко предизвикателства: системата трябва да може да извършва еднократно обучение, както и да моделира морфологията на изходния и целевия език. В тази работа предложихме рамка за оценка, която да оцени способността на невронния машинен превод да изучава непрекъснато нови фрази. Интегрираме методите на еднократно обучение за неврален машинен превод с различни думи и показваме, че е важно да се обърне внимание и на двете, за да се използва успешно двуезичните речници. Справяйки се с двете предизвикателства, ние сме в състояние да подобрим способността да превеждаме нови, редки думи и фрази от 30% до 70%. Правилната лема дори се генерира от повече от 90%.', 'da': 'Mens de seneste fremskridt inden for dyb læring førte til betydelige forbedringer i maskinoversættelse, er neural maskinoversættelse ofte stadig ikke i stand til løbende at tilpasse sig miljøet. For mennesker, såvel som for maskinoversættelse, er tosprogede ordbøger en lovende videnkilde til løbende at integrere ny viden. Udnyttelsen heraf stiller imidlertid flere udfordringer: Systemet skal kunne udføre one-shot læring samt modellere kilde- og målsprogets morfologi. I dette arbejde foreslog vi en evalueringsramme for at vurdere evnen af neural maskinoversættelse til løbende at lære nye sætninger. Vi integrerer one-shot læringsmetoder til neural maskinoversættelse med forskellige ord repræsentationer og viser, at det er vigtigt at adressere begge for at med succes gøre brug af tosprogede ordbøger. Ved at løse begge udfordringer kan vi forbedre evnen til at oversætte nye sjældne ord og sætninger fra 30% til op til 70%. Den korrekte lemma genereres endda med mere end 90%.', 'nl': 'Terwijl recente vooruitgang in deep learning heeft geleid tot aanzienlijke verbeteringen in machinevertaling, is neurale machinevertaling vaak nog niet in staat om zich continu aan te passen aan de omgeving. Zowel voor mensen als voor machinevertaling zijn tweetalige woordenboeken een veelbelovende kennisbron om voortdurend nieuwe kennis te integreren. Hun exploitatie brengt echter verschillende uitdagingen met zich mee: het systeem moet in staat zijn om eenmalig leren uit te voeren en de morfologie van bron- en doeltaal te modelleren. In dit werk hebben we een evaluatiekader voorgesteld om het vermogen van neurale machinevertaling te beoordelen om voortdurend nieuwe zinnen te leren. We integreren one-shot leermethoden voor neurale machinevertaling met verschillende woordrepresentaties en laten zien dat het belangrijk is om beide aan te pakken om succesvol gebruik te kunnen maken van tweetalige woordenboeken. Door het aanpakken van beide uitdagingen zijn we in staat nieuwe, zeldzame woorden en zinnen te vertalen van 30% tot 70%. Het juiste lemma wordt zelfs gegenereerd met meer dan 90%.', 'hr': 'Iako nedavni napredak u dubokom učenju doveo je do značajnih poboljšanja u prevodu strojeva, prevod neuronskih strojeva često se i dalje ne može stalno prilagoditi okruženju. Za ljude, kao i za prevod strojeva, dvojezičke riječi su obećavajući izvor znanja koji će stalno integrirati nove znanje. Međutim, njihova ekspluatacija predstavlja nekoliko izazova: sustav mora biti u stanju izvršiti jednostruko učenje, kao i model morfologije izvora i ciljnog jezika. U ovom poslu smo predložili okvir za procjenu sposobnosti prevoda neuralnih strojeva da nastavi naučiti nove rečenice. Integriramo metode učenja jednostruke za prevod neuralnih strojeva s različitim predstavljanjem riječi i pokazujemo da je važno obraćati se oboje kako bi uspješno iskoristili dvojezičke riječi. Oboje izazove možemo poboljšati sposobnost prevoditi nove, rijetke riječi i rečenice od 30% do 70%. Prava limuna je čak proizvedena više od 90%.', 'de': 'Während die jüngsten Fortschritte im Deep Learning zu erheblichen Verbesserungen in der maschinellen Übersetzung geführt haben, ist die neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung oft noch nicht in der Lage, sich kontinuierlich an die Umgebung anzupassen. Sowohl für den Menschen als auch für die maschinelle Übersetzung sind zweisprachige Wörterbücher eine vielversprechende Wissensquelle, um kontinuierlich neues Wissen zu integrieren. Ihre Nutzung stellt jedoch mehrere Herausforderungen dar: Das System muss in der Lage sein, einmaliges Lernen durchzuführen und die Morphologie von Ausgangs- und Zielsprache zu modellieren. In dieser Arbeit haben wir ein Evaluationsframework vorgeschlagen, um die Fähigkeit neuronaler maschineller Übersetzung zu bewerten, kontinuierlich neue Phrasen zu lernen. Wir integrieren One-Shot-Lernmethoden für neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung mit verschiedenen Wortdarstellungen und zeigen, dass es wichtig ist, beides zu adressieren, um zweisprachige Wörterbücher erfolgreich nutzen zu können. Durch die Bewältigung beider Herausforderungen können wir die Fähigkeit verbessern, neue, seltene Wörter und Phrasen von 30% bis 70% zu übersetzen. Das richtige Lemma wird sogar um mehr als 90%.', 'id': 'Sementara kemajuan belakangan ini dalam belajar dalam membawa peningkatan yang signifikan dalam terjemahan mesin, terjemahan mesin saraf sering masih tidak mampu terus-menerus beradaptasi dengan lingkungan. Untuk manusia, serta untuk terjemahan mesin, kamus dua bahasa adalah sumber pengetahuan yang berjanji untuk terus menerus mengintegrasi pengetahuan baru. Namun, eksploitasi mereka mengakibatkan beberapa tantangan: sistem perlu mampu melakukan pelajaran satu-shot serta model morfologi sumber dan bahasa sasaran. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan rangka evaluasi untuk menilai kemampuan terjemahan mesin saraf untuk terus-menerus belajar frasa baru. Kami mengintegrasikan metode belajar satu-shot untuk terjemahan mesin saraf dengan representation kata yang berbeda dan menunjukkan bahwa penting untuk mengatasi keduanya untuk berhasil menggunakan kamus dua bahasa. Dengan mengatasi kedua tantangan kita mampu meningkatkan kemampuan untuk menerjemahkan kata dan frasa baru, langka dari 30% sampai 70%. Lema yang tepat bahkan dihasilkan oleh lebih dari 90%.', 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 깊이 있는 학습 방면에서 얻은 진전은 기계 번역의 현저한 개선을 초래했지만 신경 기계 번역은 통상적으로 환경에 지속적으로 적응하지 못한다.인류와 기계 번역에 있어 이중 언어 사전은 끊임없이 새로운 지식을 통합시키는 유망한 지식 원천이다.그러나 이들의 개발은 몇 가지 도전을 가져왔다. 이 시스템은 일회성 학습을 수행할 수 있고 원시 언어와 목표 언어의 형태를 모델링할 수 있어야 한다.이 작업에서 우리는 신경기계 번역이 새로운 단어를 지속적으로 학습하는 능력을 평가하는 틀을 제시했다.우리는 신경기계 번역의 학습 방법과 서로 다른 단어 표시를 결합시켜 이중 언어 사전을 성공적으로 사용하기 위해 이 두 가지 문제를 해결하는 것이 중요하다는 것을 나타낸다.이 두 가지 도전에 대응함으로써 우리는 새로운, 보기 드문 단어와 단어의 번역 능력을 30%에서 70%로 향상시킬 수 있다.정확한 인용은 심지어 90퍼센트 이상까지 생길 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Wakati maendeleo ya hivi karibuni katika kujifunza kwa kina yalisababisha maendeleo makubwa katika tafsiri ya mashine, tafsiri ya mashine ya kijamii mara nyingi bado haiwezi kubadili mazingira. Kwa binadamu, pamoja na tafsiri ya mashine, lugha za lugha mbili ni chanzo cha maarifa kinachofaa kuendelea kuunganisha maarifa mpya. Hata hivyo, matumizi yao yanaleta changamoto kadhaa: Mfumo unahitaji kuweza kufanya elimu ya moja kwa moja pamoja na mfano wa folojia ya vyanzo na lugha inayolenga. Katika kazi hii, tulipendekeza mfumo wa tathmini ili kutathmini uwezo wa tafsiri ya mashine ya ujasiri ili kuendelea kujifunza maneno mpya. Tunaunganisha njia za kujifunza kwa njia moja kwa moja kwa ajili ya kutafsiri mashine ya ubongo kwa uwakilishi wa maneno tofauti na kuonyesha kuwa ni muhimu kuzungumza wote ili kwa mafanikio kutumia lugha mbili. Kwa kuongea changamoto hizi mbili tunaweza kuboresha uwezo wa kutafsiri maneno mpya, nadra na maneno kutoka asilimia 30 hadi asilimia 70. Nyimba sahihi imezaliwa kwa zaidi ya asilimia 90.', 'tr': 'Ýakynda gaty öwrenmek üçin öňki gelişmeler maşynyň terjimelerinde esasy gelişmelere ýok edipdir, näyral maşynyň terjimeleri öňe daşary çevrede üýtgeşip bilmeýär. Adamlar üçin we maşynyň terjime edilmesi üçin iki dil sözleri täze bilim bilen üýtgetmek üçin söz berýän bir bilim çeşmidir. Ýöne olaryň ulanmaklarynyň birnäçe kynçylyklary bar: sistemasyň ýekeje atly öwrenmesini hem çeşme we maksadyň morfologiýasyny edip bilmegi gerek. Bu işde, täze sözleri öwrenmek üçin näyral maşynyň terjimesiniň başarylygyny barlamak üçin deňlenme çerçevesini teklip etdik. Biz neural maşynyň terjimesi üçin bir çekim öwrenmek yöntemlerini farklı sözler bilen üýtgedýäris we iki dil sözlerini başarmak üçin hem çözmek üçin wajyplygyny görkeýäris. Iki kynçylyklary çözerek täze, nadir sözleri we sözleri 30% we 70% tarap terjime etmek başarmagy başararys. Dogry lemma 90 den köp tarapyndan üretildi.', 'fa': 'در حالی که پیشرفت های اخیر در یادگیری عمیق به سوی تغییرات زیادی در ترجمه ماشین به وجود آورد، ترجمه ماشین عصبی اغلب هنوز قادر نیست که به محیط ادامه بده. برای انسان، همچنین برای ترجمه ماشین، کلمات دوزبانی یک منبع دانش قول می دهد که همیشه دانش جدید را جمع کند. ولی استفاده کردن آنها چند چالش را می\u200cکند: سیستم باید بتواند یادگیری یک بار را انجام دهد و مدل مورفولوژی منبع و زبان هدف را انجام دهد. در این کار، ما پیشنهاد دادیم یک چهارچوب ارزیابی برای ارزیابی توانایی ترجمه ماشین عصبی برای یاد گرفتن جمله های جدید. ما روش یادگیری یک بار برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی با نمایش\u200cهای کلمه\u200cای متفاوت جمع می\u200cکنیم و نشان می\u200cدهیم که این مهم است که با موفقیت از کلمه\u200cهای دو زبان استفاده کنیم. با استفاده از هر دو چالش توانایی برای ترجمه کردن کلمات جدید، نادر و جمله\u200cها از 30% تا 70% بهتر می\u200cکنیم. لیما درست حتی با بیشتر از ۹۰ درصد تولید شده است.', 'af': "Terwyl onlangse vorderings in diep leer gelei het na betekende verbeteringe in masjien vertaling, is neurale masjien vertaling dikwels nog nie in staat om voortdurende aan die omgewing te pas nie. Vir mense, asook vir masjien vertaling, is twee tale woordeboeke 'n beloftende kennisbron om nuwe kennis tot voortdurend te integreer. Maar hulle ekspluatasie poseer verskeie uitdagings: Die stelsel moet een-skoot leer en model die morfologie van bron en doel taal kan uitvoer. In hierdie werk het ons 'n evaluering raamwerk voorgestel om die moontlikheid van neurale masjien vertaling te asseer om nuwe frase te leer. Ons integreer een-skoot leermeetode vir neurale masjien vertaling met verskillende woorde verteenwoordes en wys dat dit belangrik is om beide te adres om suksesvol te gebruik van twee tale woordeboeke. Deur beide uitdagings te raak, kan ons die moontlikheid verbeter om nuwe, selfde woorde en frase te vertaal van 30% tot by 70%. Die korrekte lemma is selfs genereer deur meer as 90%.", 'sq': 'Ndërsa përparimet e fundit në mësimin e thellë çuan në përmirësime të rëndësishme në përkthimin e makinave, përkthimi i makinave nervore shpesh nuk është ende në gjendje të përshtatet vazhdimisht në mjedis. For humans, as well as for machine translation, bilingual dictionaries are a promising knowledge source to continuously integrate new knowledge.  Megjithatë, shfrytëzimi i tyre paraqet disa sfida: Sistemi duhet të jetë në gjendje të kryejë mësim me një gjuhë si dhe të modelojë morfologjinë e burimit dhe gjuhës objektive. Në këtë punë, propozuam një kuadër vlerësimi për të vlerësuar aftësinë e përkthimit të makinave nervore për të mësuar vazhdimisht fraza të reja. Ne integrojmë metodat e mësimit me një gjurmë për përkthimin e makinave nervore me përfaqësime të ndryshme fjalësh dhe tregojmë se është e rëndësishme të trajtohemi të dy me qëllim që të përdorim me sukses fjalorët dy-gjuhës. Duke trajtuar të dy sfidat ne jemi në gjendje të përmirësojmë aftësinë për të përkthyer fjalë dhe fraza të reja, të rralla nga 30% në 70%. Lima e saktë gjenerohet edhe me më shumë se 90%.', 'hy': 'Մինչդեռ խորը ուսումնասիրության վերջին զարգացումները մեքենայի թարգմանման կարևոր բարելավումներ են հանգեցրել, նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանումը հաճախ դեռ չի կարողանում անընդհատ հարմարվել շրջա For humans, as well as for machine translation, bilingual dictionaries are a promising knowledge source to continuously integrate new knowledge.  However, their exploitation poses several challenges: The system needs to be able to perform one-shot learning as well as model the morphology of source and target language.  Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկեցինք գնահատման շրջանակ, որպեսզի գնահատենք նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման կարողությունը շարունակաբար նոր արտահայտություններ սովորելու: Մենք ինտեգրում ենք նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման միասնական ուսումնական մեթոդներ տարբեր բառերի ներկայացումներով և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ կարևոր է լուծել երկու բառերը, որպեսզի հաջողությամբ օգտագործենք երկլեզու բառարաններ: Երկու մարտահրավերներին լուծելով մենք կարող ենք բարելավել նոր, հազվադեպ բառերի և արտահայտությունների թարգմանման ունակությունը 30-ից մինչև 70-ը: Ճիշտ լիմոն նույնիսկ 90 տոկոսով է ստեղծում:', 'am': 'የቀድሞው የጥልቅ ትምህርት ግንኙነት በመሣሪያው ትርጉም የሚያሳውቀው ሲሆን፣ የናውራዊ መሣሪያን ትርጉም ብዙ ጊዜው በአካባቢው ላይ ለመቀናቀል አይችልም፡፡ ለሰዎች፣ ለmachine ትርጓሜ እና ለቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች አዲስ እውቀትን ለማቀናቀል የተስፋ እውቀት ምንጭ ናቸው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን ግንኙነታቸው ብዙዎችን የጥላቻዎች አቀረበ፡፡ ሲስተማሩ አንድ ፎቶ ትምህርት ማድረግ እንዲችል ነው፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ አዲስ ንግግር ለመማር የናውሬው የሆኑት መሣሪያን ትርጉም ኃይል ለማስተዋል መክፈቻን አግኝተናል፡፡ በሁለት ቋንቋዎች ላይ ለመጠቀም የናውራዊ መሣሪያን ትርጉም በተለየ ቃላት መልዕክቶች እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ አዲስ፣ ንጹሕ ቃላት እና ቃላትን ከ30 በመቶ ጀምሮ እስከ 70 በመቶ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የተሻለ እሜት በ90 በመቶ ላይ ነው፡፡', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক ক্ষেত্রে গভীর শিক্ষার উন্নয়নের ফলে মেশিন অনুবাদের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নয়ন ঘটেছে, তবে নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ প্রায মানুষের জন্য, এবং মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য, দুই ভাষার অভিধান হচ্ছে নতুন জ্ঞান সম্পূর্ণ করার জন্য। তবে তাদের ব্যবহারের বেশ কয়েকটি চ্যালেঞ্জের মাধ্যমে রয়েছে: সিস্টেমের একটি গুলি শিক্ষা শেখানোর প্রয়োজন এবং উৎস এবং লক্ষ্য ভাষার ম এই কাজে আমরা নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদের ক্ষমতা চিন্তা করার প্রস্তাব দিয়েছিলাম যাতে নতুন বাক্য শিখতে পারে। আমরা বিভিন্ন শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্ব দিয়ে নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য এক গুলি শিক্ষার পদ্ধতি একত্রিত করি এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে দুই ভাষার অভিভ দুটো চ্যালেঞ্জের কথা বলার মাধ্যমে আমরা নতুন, বিদায় শব্দ এবং বাক্য অনুবাদ করতে পারি ৩০% থেকে ৭০ শতাংশ পর্যন্ত। The correct lemma is even generated by more than 90%.', 'az': 'Yaxınlıq öyrənməsi maşın çevirindəki çox yaxşılıqlarına yol göstərdiyi halda, nöral maşın çeviri hələ də ortama sürəklə uyğunlaşa bilməz. İnsanlar üçün, maşın çevirilməsi üçün də, iki dil sözləri yeni bilgi ilə birləşdirmək üçün və ’ d olunan elm mənbəsidir. Lakin onların istifadəsi birçox çətinliklərə bənzəyir: Sistem bir fəst öyrənməsini və mənbə və məqsəd dilinin morfolojisini təsdiqləməsi lazımdır. Bu işdə, yeni sözləri öyrənmək üçün nöral maşına çevirilməsinin qabiliyyətini təmin etmək üçün təklif etdik. Biz nöral maşına çevirilməsi üçün bir dəfə öyrənmə metodlarını müxtəlif sözlərlə birləşdiririk və iki dil sözlərini müvəffəqiyyətlə istifadə etmək üçün hər ikisini də çəkmək üçün vacib olduğunu göstəririk. İki çətinliklərə çəkinərək yeni, nadir sözləri və sözləri 30%-dən 70%-ə çevirə bilərik. Doğru limma 90%-dən artıq yaradılır.', 'ca': "Mentre els avanços recents en l'aprenentatge profund van portar a millores significatives en la traducció de màquines, sovint la traducció neural de màquines encara no es pot adaptar continuament al medi ambient. Per als humans i per a la traducció màquina, els diccionaris bilingües són una fontde coneixement prometedora per integrar continuament el nou coneixement. Però la seva explotació pose diversos reptes: el sistema ha de ser capaç d'aprendre una sola fotografia i de modelar la morfologia de la llengua d'origen i l'objectiu. En aquest treball vam proposar un marc d'evaluació per avaluar l'habilitat de la traducció neuromàtica d'aprendre constantment frases noves. We integrate one-shot learning methods for neural machine translation with different word representations and show that it is important to address both in order to successfully make use of bilingual dictionaries.  Respectant ambdós reptes podem millorar l'habilitat de traduir paraules i frases noves i rares del 30% al 70%. El llema correcte està generat fins i tot en més del 90%.", 'bs': 'Iako nedavni napredak u dubokom učenju doveo je do značajnih poboljšanja u prevodu strojeva, prevod neuronskih strojeva često se i dalje ne može stalno prilagoditi okolini. Za ljude, kao i za prevod mašine, dvije jezičke riječi su obećavajući izvor znanja koji će stalno integrirati nove znanje. Međutim, njihova ekspluatacija predstavlja nekoliko izazova: sistem mora biti u stanju da izvrši jednostruko učenje, kao i model morfologije izvora i ciljnog jezika. U ovom poslu smo predložili okvir procjene sposobnosti prevoda neuralne mašine da nastavi naučiti nove rečenice. Integriramo metode učenja jednosnijeg snimka za prevod neuralnih strojeva sa različitim predstavljanjem riječi i pokazujemo da je važno obraćati se oboje kako bi uspješno iskoristili dvojezičke riječi. Kada se riješimo oba izazova, možemo poboljšati sposobnost prevoditi nove, rijetke riječi i rečenice od 30% do 70%. Prava limuna je čak stvorena više od 90%.', 'cs': 'Zatímco nedávné pokroky v hlubokém učení vedly k výrazným zlepšením strojového překladu, neurální strojový překlad se často stále nedokáže neustále přizpůsobovat prostředí. Pro člověka, stejně jako pro strojový překlad, jsou dvojjazyčné slovníky slibným zdrojem znalostí pro neustálé integrování nových znalostí. Jejich využití však představuje několik výzev: systém musí být schopen provádět jednorázové učení a modelovat morfologii zdrojového a cílového jazyka. V této práci jsme navrhli evaluační rámec pro posouzení schopnosti neuronového strojového překladu neustále se učit nové fráze. Integrujeme jednorázové učební metody pro neuronový strojový překlad s různými reprezentacemi slov a ukazujeme, že je důležité řešit oba pro úspěšné využití dvojjazyčných slovníků. Řešením obou výzev jsme schopni zlepšit schopnost překládat nová, vzácná slova a fráze od 30% do 70%. Správné lemma je generováno dokonce o více než 90%.', 'et': 'Kuigi hiljutised edusammud sügavõppes viisid masintõlkes märkimisväärse paranemiseni, ei suuda neuromasintõlk ikka veel keskkonnaga pidevalt kohaneda. Inimestele ja masintõlkele on kakskeelsed sõnastikud paljulubavaks teadmisteallikaks uute teadmiste pidevaks integreerimiseks. Nende kasutamine tekitab siiski mitmeid väljakutseid: süsteem peab suutma läbi viia ühekordset õppimist ning modelleerima lähte- ja sihtkeele morfoloogiat. Selles töös pakkusime välja hindamisraamistiku, et hinnata neuromasintõlke võimet pidevalt õppida uusi fraase. Integreerime neuromasintõlke ühekordsed õppemeetodid erinevate sõnade esitamisega ning näitame, et kahekeelsete sõnaraamatute edukaks kasutamiseks on oluline tegeleda mõlemaga. Mõlema probleemiga tegelemisel suudame parandada uute haruldaste sõnade ja fraaside tõlkimise võimet 30%-lt kuni 70%-ni. Õige lemma tekib isegi rohkem kui 90%.', 'fi': 'Vaikka viimeaikainen kehitys syväoppimisessa on johtanut merkittäviin parannuksiin konekäännöksessä, neurokonekäännös ei useinkaan pysty jatkuvasti sopeutumaan ympäristöön. Ihmisille ja konekäännöksille kaksikieliset sanakirjat ovat lupaava tietolähde uuden tiedon jatkuvaan integrointiin. Niiden hyödyntäminen asettaa kuitenkin useita haasteita: Järjestelmän on kyettävä suorittamaan kertaoppimista sekä mallintamaan lähtö- ja kohdekielen morfologiaa. Tässä työssä ehdotimme arviointikehystä, jolla arvioidaan neurokonekäännöksen kykyä oppia jatkuvasti uusia lauseita. Integroimme neurokonekäännöksen kertaluonteisia oppimismenetelmiä erilaisiin sanaesityksiin ja osoitamme, että molempia on tärkeää käsitellä, jotta kaksikielisiä sanakirjoja voidaan hyödyntää menestyksekkäästi. Vastaamalla molempiin haasteisiin pystymme parantamaan kykyä kääntää uusia harvinaisia sanoja ja lauseita 30 prosentista 70 prosenttiin. Oikea lemma syntyy jopa yli 90%.', 'jv': 'Nyong ngopo sekang tarjamahan sing paling nggambar luwih dumadhi, dadi kapan kanggo tukang karo penting macian, terjamahan e nyebute kuwi mau, ora iso dianggap kanggo mbanjurahan. kanggo wong-wong Nanging, patingkat awak dhéwé iso nggawe sakjane sampeyan akeh lan ujaran: sistem kudu bisa ngejaraké sewisan sampeyan ngono model model kuwi sukses lan tarjamahan. Nang gunggo iki, kita nggunakake sistem asserti kanggo ngerasakno kapan kanggo tarjamahan karo sistem, nggawe barang nggawe barang. Awak dhéwé isih sistem sing beraksi pergambar lan mbukak gambar alat sing sampeyan gambar lan gambar nggawe kudu nggawe kudu kelas kuwi wis dipunahan kanggo nguasai diktualisar sampeyan sing berarti. Ngawe ngubah nambah sing beraksi sing gak dhéwé iso nglanggar kapan kanggo terusah dumadhi, gambar sing dumadhi karo perangkat sing 30% sampek 75%. Laptop" and "Desktop', 'ha': "A lokacin da masu ƙari da aka sani masu ƙaranci sun ƙara mafiya kyau cikin fassarar mashine, fassarar maɓallin neural ko da yawa ba su iya daidai kwamfyutan mazaɓa ba. Ga mutum, da kuma don fassarar misalin kafin, dictionaries biyu ne mai yi wa'adi da sanin da za'a iya haɗa zanen kodi. Kayyada, amfani da su yana da wasu ta'ummõmi: Ana so, ya kamata in iya iya iya cika wa'anar da kwamfyuta guda, da kuma ya sami misalin morfolojiya na'urar da harshe na ƙayyade. Daga wannan aikin, muka buɗa wani firam mai evaluation dõmin ya ƙaddara awon fassarar masu ƙarami da za'a iya karanta misalin mutane daidai. We integrate one-shot learning methods for neural machine translation with different word representations and show that it is important to address both in order to successfully make use of bilingual dictionaries.  Ina iya amfani da izgili biyu ko kuma za mu iya ƙara awon a fassarar magana na new, rare da magana daga 30% zuwa 70%. QXml", 'sk': 'Medtem ko je nedavni napredek na področju globokega učenja pripeljal do znatnih izboljšav strojnega prevajanja, se nevronski strojni prevod pogosto še vedno ne more nenehno prilagajati okolju. Za ljudi in strojno prevajanje so dvojezični slovarji obetaven vir znanja za nenehno vključevanje novega znanja. Vendar pa njihovo izkoriščanje predstavlja več izzivov: sistem mora biti sposoben izvajati enkratno učenje ter modelirati morfologijo izvornega in ciljnega jezika. V tem delu smo predlagali ocenjevalni okvir za oceno sposobnosti nevronskega strojnega prevajanja za stalno učenje novih fraz. Enotne metode učenja nevralnega strojnega prevajanja združujemo z različnimi predstavitvami besed in pokažemo, da je pomembno obravnavati obe, da bi uspešno uporabili dvojezične slovarje. Z obravnavanjem obeh izzivov lahko izboljšamo sposobnost prevajanja novih, redkih besed in besednih zvez od 30% do 70%. Pravilna lemma je celo ustvarjena za več kot 90%.', 'he': 'בעוד התקדמות האחרונות בלמדה עמוקה הובילו לשיפורים משמעותיים בתרגום מכונות, התרגום מכונות עצביות לעתים קרובות עדיין לא מסוגל להתאים באופן קבוע לסביבה. עבור בני אדם, כמו גם לתרגום מכונות, מילונים שתיים-שפתיים הם מקור ידע מבטיח להשתלב מידע חדש. בכל אופן, ניצול שלהם מוציא כמה אתגרים: המערכת צריכה להיות מסוגלת לבצע לימוד חד-ירי כמו גם מודל המורפולוגיה של מקור ושפה המטרה. בעבודה הזו הצענו מסגרת עריכה כדי להעריך את היכולת של התרגום של מכונות עצביות ללמוד משפטים חדשים. אנחנו משתלבים שיטות למידה אחת לתרגום מכונת עצבית עם מילים שונות ומראים שזה חשוב להתייחס לשניהם כדי להשתמש בהצלחה במילונים שתיים. על ידי להתמודד עם שני האתגרים אנחנו מסוגלים לשפר את היכולת לתרגם מילים נדירות חדשות ועד 70%. הלימה הנכונה אפילו יוצרת על ידי יותר מ-90%.', 'bo': 'ཉེ་ཆར་གཞུང་གི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཟབ་རིམ་ལྷན་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བཞིན་ཡིན་ནའང་མ་ལག་གི་སྐྱེས་ཚུལ་ལྗོངས་དང་། དཔུད་རིམ་ལག་ འདི་ནི་མི་དང་ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་མཚོན་ན། སྐད་རིགས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ཡིག ཡིན་ནའང་། ཁོང་ཚོའི་exploitation་ནི་གདོང་ལེན་དགོས་པ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་ཀྱང་། མ་ལག་གི་དོན་རྐྱེན་གཅིག་གནོང་ལེན་སྤྱོད་ཐབས་ལམ་ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རྩོལ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ནུས་མཐུན་གྱི་ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་སྐྱེས་ཚིག་རྩིས་མྱོང་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་། ང་ཚོས་བརྗོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཅིག་གི་འགྱུར་བ་དང་ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་ཡིག གདོང་ལེན་གཉིས་ཀྱི་གདོང་ལེན་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་གསར་པ་ཞིག་ལ་སྤྲོད་ན་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ་ལས་30ཡིས་70%,  ནོར་དག་ཀྱི་lemས་ཟིན་བྲིས་པ་དེ་ཅིག90་ལས་བརྩོན་བྱས་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Adv-OLM : Generating Textual Adversaries via OLM', 'es': 'Adv-OLM: Generación de adversarios textuales a través de OLM', 'fr': 'ADV-OLM\xa0: Générer des adversaires textuels via OLM', 'pt': 'Adv-OLM: gerando adversários textuais via OLM', 'ar': 'Adv-OLM: إنشاء خصوم نصيين عبر OLM', 'ja': 'Adv - OLM ： OLMを介してテキストの敵対者を生成する', 'hi': 'Adv-OLM: OLM के माध्यम से पाठ्य विरोधियों को उत्पन्न करना', 'zh': 'Adv-OLM:以 OLM 生文', 'ru': 'Adv-OLM: Создание текстовых противников через OLM', 'ga': 'Adv-OLM: Sáraimh Téacs a Ghiniúint trí OLM', 'ka': 'Comment', 'hu': 'Adv-OLM: Szöveges hirdetések generálása OLM segítségével', 'el': 'Adv-OLM: Δημιουργία κειμένων αντιπροσώπων μέσω OLM', 'kk': 'Adv- OLM: OLM арқылы мәтіндік кеңейтулерді құру', 'it': 'Adv-OLM: Generare annunci testuali tramite OLM', 'lt': 'Adv-OLM: Tekstinių prieštaravimų sukūrimas per OLM', 'mk': 'Adv- OLM: Генерирање на текстуални непријатели преку OLM', 'ms': 'Adv-OLM: Menjana Adversaries Teks melalui OLM', 'mt': 'Adv-OLM: Il-Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Adversarji Tekstiċi permezz tal-OLM', 'no': 'Adv- OLM: Lagar tekstvindauge via OLM', 'pl': 'Adv-OLM: generowanie tekstowych przeciwników przez OLM', 'ml': 'Adv-OLM: Generating Textual Adversaries via OLM', 'mn': 'Adv-OLM: OLM-ын аргаар текст дэмжигчид бий болгож', 'si': 'ADOLM: OLM මධ්\u200dයමයෙන් පාළුවන් ප්\u200dරවේශකය නිර්මාණය කරනවා', 'so': 'Adv-OLM: Generation Textual Adversaries via OLM', 'sr': 'Adv-OLM: Generiranje tekstualnih poremećaja preko OLM-a', 'ro': 'Adv-OLM: Generarea de adversari textuale prin intermediul OLM', 'sv': 'Adv-OLM: Generera textannonser via OLM', 'ta': 'முன்- OLM: OLM மூலம் உருவாக்குதல்', 'ur': 'Adv-OLM: OLM کے ذریعہ تفصیل اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا سامان پیدا کیا جاتا ہے', 'vi': 'Ad-OLM: Tạo ra Nhắn Tin lành qua OLM.', 'uz': 'Adv-OLM: Generating Textual Adversaries via OLM', 'hr': 'Adv-OLM: Generiranje tekstualnih nuspojava preko OLM', 'bg': 'Adv-OLM: Генериране на текстови реклами чрез OLM', 'nl': 'Adv-OLM: Tekstuele Adversaries genereren via OLM', 'ko': 'Adv OLM: OLM을 통한 텍스트 상대 생성', 'da': 'Adv-OLM: Generering af tekstreklamer via OLM', 'fa': 'Adv-OLM: تولید مخالفت\u200cکننده\u200cهای Textual via OLM', 'de': 'Adv-OLM: Generierung textueller Adversaries über OLM', 'id': 'Adv-OLM: Generating Textual Adversaries via OLM', 'sw': 'Utengenezaji wa Kiteknolojia kwa kutumia OLM', 'sq': 'Adv-OLM: Gjenerimi i kundërshtarëve tekstualë nëpërmjet OLM', 'af': 'Adv- OLM: Genereer Tekstuele Adversaries deur OLM', 'am': 'Adv-OLM: Generating Text Adversaries via OLM', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Adv-OLM: OLM vasit…Щsil…Щ Textual Adversaries icat edilir', 'bn': 'অএলএম ম মাধ্যমে টেক্সটুয়াল অ্যাডভারেরি তৈরি করা হচ্ছে', 'tr': 'Adv-OLM: OLM üzerinden Textual Adversaries oluşturuyor', 'ca': 'Adv-OLM: generar adversaris textuals a través de OLM', 'cs': 'Adv-OLM: Generování textových nepříznivců prostřednictvím OLM', 'bs': 'Adv-OLM: Generiranje tekstualnih poremećaja preko OLM-a', 'et': 'Adv-OLM: Tekstaalsete kõrvaltoimete genereerimine OLM-i kaudu', 'fi': 'Adv-OLM: Tekstuaalisten haittavaikutusten luominen OLM:n kautta', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'he': 'Adv-OLM: Generating Textual Adversaries via OLM', 'sk': 'Adv-OLM: Ustvarjanje besedilnih oglasov prek OLM', 'bo': 'Adv-OLM: OLM དང་ཐོག་ཡིག་གི་གདོང་མཁན་ཚོས་གསར་བཟོ་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ', 'jv': 'Adv-OlM: Generating textual Advrsary by OlM'}
{'en': 'Deep learning models are susceptible to adversarial examples that have imperceptible perturbations in the original input, resulting in adversarial attacks against these models. Analysis of these attacks on the state of the art transformers in NLP can help improve the robustness of these models against such adversarial inputs. In this paper, we present Adv-OLM, a black-box attack method that adapts the idea of Occlusion and Language Models (OLM) to the current state of the art attack methods. OLM is used to rank words of a sentence, which are later substituted using word replacement strategies. We experimentally show that our approach outperforms other attack methods for several text classification tasks.', 'fr': "Les modèles d'apprentissage profond sont sensibles aux exemples contradictoires qui présentent des perturbations imperceptibles dans l'entrée d'origine, ce qui entraîne des attaques contradictoires contre ces modèles. L'analyse de ces attaques contre les transformateurs de pointe en PNL peut aider à améliorer la robustesse de ces modèles face à de telles entrées contradictoires. Dans cet article, nous présentons ADV-OLM, une méthode d'attaque en boîte noire qui adapte l'idée des modèles d'occlusion et de langage (OLM) aux méthodes d'attaque de pointe actuelles. OLM est utilisé pour classer les mots d'une phrase, qui sont ensuite substitués à l'aide de stratégies de remplacement de mots. Nous montrons expérimentalement que notre approche surpasse les autres méthodes d'attaque pour plusieurs tâches de classification de texte.", 'es': 'Los modelos de aprendizaje profundo son susceptibles a ejemplos contradictorios que tienen perturbaciones imperceptibles en la entrada original, lo que resulta en ataques adversarios contra estos modelos. El análisis de estos ataques a los transformadores de última generación en la PNL puede ayudar a mejorar la solidez de estos modelos frente a tales insumos adversarios. En este artículo, presentamos AdV-OLM, un método de ataque de caja negra que adapta la idea de los modelos de oclusión y lenguaje (OLM) a los métodos de ataque actuales. El OLM se utiliza para clasificar las palabras de una oración, que luego se sustituyen mediante estrategias de reemplazo de palabras. Demostramos experimentalmente que nuestro enfoque supera a otros métodos de ataque en varias tareas de clasificación de texto.', 'ar': 'نماذج التعلم العميق عرضة للأمثلة العدائية التي لها اضطرابات غير محسوسة في المدخلات الأصلية ، مما يؤدي إلى هجمات معادية ضد هذه النماذج. يمكن أن يساعد تحليل هذه الهجمات على أحدث المحولات في معالجة اللغات الطبيعية في تحسين متانة هذه النماذج ضد مثل هذه المدخلات العدائية. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم Adv-OLM ، وهي طريقة هجوم الصندوق الأسود تتكيف مع فكرة الانسداد ونماذج اللغة (OLM) مع أحدث أساليب الهجوم الفنية. يتم استخدام OLM لترتيب كلمات الجملة ، والتي يتم استبدالها لاحقًا باستخدام استراتيجيات استبدال الكلمات. لقد أظهرنا تجريبياً أن أسلوبنا يتفوق على طرق الهجوم الأخرى في العديد من مهام تصنيف النص.', 'pt': 'Modelos de aprendizado profundo são suscetíveis a exemplos adversários que possuem perturbações imperceptíveis na entrada original, resultando em ataques adversários contra esses modelos. A análise desses ataques aos transformadores de última geração em PNL pode ajudar a melhorar a robustez desses modelos contra essas entradas adversárias. Neste artigo, apresentamos o Adv-OLM, um método de ataque caixa-preta que adapta a ideia de Oclusão e Modelos de Linguagem (OLM) aos métodos atuais de ataque de última geração. OLM é usado para classificar palavras de uma frase, que são posteriormente substituídas usando estratégias de substituição de palavras. Mostramos experimentalmente que nossa abordagem supera outros métodos de ataque para várias tarefas de classificação de texto.', 'ja': '深層学習モデルは、元の入力に感知できない摂動を持つ対立的な例に影響されやすく、これらのモデルに対する対立的な攻撃をもたらします。ＮＬＰにおける最先端の変圧器に対するこれらの攻撃の分析は、そのような対抗入力に対するこれらのモデルの堅牢性を改善するのに役立つことができる。本稿では，オクルージョン・アンド・ランゲージ・モデル（ OLM ）の考え方を現状の最先端の攻撃手法に適合させるブラックボックス攻撃手法であるAdv - OLMを紹介する。OLMは、文の単語をランク付けするために使用され、後で単語置換戦略を使用して置換されます。私たちのアプローチは、いくつかのテキスト分類タスクで他の攻撃方法よりも優れていることを実験的に示しています。', 'zh': '深习模对抗性示例,示例扰于始,以至于对抗性。 论此NLP之先进变压器可以助高对抗性之鲁棒性。 本文见Adv-OLM,此黑盒攻击之法,遮蔽言语(OLM)意用先进之术也。 OLM 以对句中单词为名,单词稍后用单词易策。 吾以实验明之,于文本分类,吾道优于他攻。', 'hi': 'डीप लर्निंग मॉडल प्रतिकूल उदाहरणों के लिए अतिसंवेदनशील होते हैं जिनमें मूल इनपुट में अगोचर गड़बड़ी होती है, जिसके परिणामस्वरूप इन मॉडलों के खिलाफ प्रतिकूल हमले होते हैं। एनएलपी में कला ट्रांसफार्मर की स्थिति पर इन हमलों का विश्लेषण इस तरह के प्रतिकूल इनपुट के खिलाफ इन मॉडलों की मजबूती में सुधार करने में मदद कर सकता है। इस पेपर में, हम एडव-ओएलएम प्रस्तुत करते हैं, एक ब्लैक-बॉक्स अटैक विधि जो रोड़ा और भाषा मॉडल (ओएलएम) के विचार को कला हमले के तरीकों की वर्तमान स्थिति में अनुकूलित करती है। ओएलएम का उपयोग एक वाक्य के शब्दों को रैंक करने के लिए किया जाता है, जिन्हें बाद में शब्द प्रतिस्थापन रणनीतियों का उपयोग करके प्रतिस्थापित किया जाता है। हम प्रयोगात्मक रूप से दिखाते हैं कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण कई पाठ वर्गीकरण कार्यों के लिए अन्य हमले के तरीकों को बेहतर बनाता है।', 'ru': 'Модели глубокого обучения восприимчивы к соперническим примерам, которые имеют незаметные возмущения в первоначальном входе, что приводит к соперническим атакам на эти модели. Анализ этих атак на современные трансформаторы в NLP может помочь улучшить устойчивость этих моделей против таких враждебных входных данных. В этой статье мы представляем Adv-OLM, метод атаки в черном ящике, который адаптирует идею окклюзионных и языковых моделей (OLM) к текущему состоянию современных методов атаки. OLM используется для ранжирования слов предложения, которые позже заменяются с помощью стратегий замены слов. Экспериментально показано, что наш подход превосходит другие методы атаки для нескольких задач классификации текста.', 'ga': 'Is féidir le múnlaí domhainfhoghlama samplaí sáraíochta a bhfuil suaitheadh do-airithe acu san ionchur bunaidh, rud a fhágann go mbíonn ionsaithe sáraíochta ar na múnlaí sin. Is féidir le hanailís ar na hionsaithe seo ar chlaochladáin úrscothacha in NLP cabhrú le stóinseacht na múnlaí sin a fheabhsú i gcoinne ionchur sáraíochta den sórt sin. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid Adv-OLM i láthair, modh ionsaí an bhosca dhubh a chuireann an smaoineamh Occlusion agus Language Models (OLM) in oiriúint do na modhanna ionsaithe ar an staid reatha. Úsáidtear OLM chun focail abairte a rangú, a chuirtear ina n-ionad níos déanaí ag baint úsáide as straitéisí athsholáthair focal. Léirímid go turgnamhach go sáraíonn ár gcur chuige modhanna ionsaithe eile maidir le roinnt tascanna aicmithe téacs.', 'el': 'Τα μοντέλα βαθιάς μάθησης είναι ευαίσθητα σε αντικρουόμενα παραδείγματα που έχουν ανεπαίσθητες διαταραχές στην αρχική εισαγωγή, με αποτέλεσμα αντιπαραθέσεις εναντίον αυτών των μοντέλων. Η ανάλυση αυτών των επιθέσεων στους μετασχηματιστές τελευταίας τεχνολογίας στο ΝΛΠ μπορεί να βοηθήσει στη βελτίωση της ανθεκτικότητας αυτών των μοντέλων έναντι τέτοιων αντίθετων εισροών. Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια μέθοδο επίθεσης μαύρου κουτιού που προσαρμόζει την ιδέα των μοντέλων Αποκάλυψης και Γλώσσας (ΟΛΜ) στις σύγχρονες μεθόδους επίθεσης. Το χρησιμοποιείται για την ταξινόμηση λέξεων μιας πρότασης, οι οποίες αργότερα αντικαθίστανται χρησιμοποιώντας στρατηγικές αντικατάστασης λέξεων. Δείχνουμε πειραματικά ότι η προσέγγισή μας ξεπερνά άλλες μεθόδους επίθεσης για διάφορες εργασίες ταξινόμησης κειμένου.', 'hu': 'A mélytanulási modellek érzékenyek az ellenséges példákra, amelyek az eredeti bemenetben észrevehetetlen zavarokat mutatnak, ami ellenséges támadásokat eredményez ezekkel a modellekkel szemben. A legkorszerűbb transzformátorok elleni támadások elemzése NLP-ben segíthet javítani ezen modellek robusztusságát az ilyen ellentétes bemenetekkel szemben. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk az Adv-OLM-et, egy fekete dobozos támadási módszert, amely az okkluzió és nyelvi modellek (OLM) ötletét a jelenlegi korszerű támadási módszerekhez igazítja. Az OLM egy mondat szavainak rangsorolására szolgál, amelyeket később szóhelyettesítő stratégiákkal helyettesítenek. Kísérletileg kimutatjuk, hogy megközelítésünk több szövegosztályozási feladat esetében felülmúlja a többi támadási módszert.', 'it': "I modelli di deep learning sono suscettibili ad esempi avversi che presentano perturbazioni impercettibili nell'input originale, con conseguente attacco avversario contro questi modelli. L'analisi di questi attacchi ai trasformatori all'avanguardia in NLP può aiutare a migliorare la robustezza di questi modelli contro tali input avversi. In questo articolo, presentiamo Adv-OLM, un metodo di attacco black-box che adatta l'idea di Occlusion and Language Models (OLM) allo stato attuale dei metodi di attacco. OLM è usato per classificare le parole di una frase, che vengono successivamente sostituite utilizzando strategie di sostituzione delle parole. Mostriamo sperimentalmente che il nostro approccio supera altri metodi di attacco per diverse attività di classificazione del testo.", 'mk': 'Моделите за длабоко учење се чувствителни на непријателски примери кои имаат непријатни пертурбирања во оригиналниот внес, што резултираат со непријателски напади против овие модели. Анализата на овие напади врз најсовремените трансформатори во НЛП може да помогне во подобрувањето на силноста на овие модели против ваквите непријателски внесувања. Во овој весник, го претставуваме Ав-ОЛМ, метод на напад во црна кутија кој ја адаптира идејата за оклозија и јазични модели (ОЛМ) на сегашните методи на најсовремени напади. OLM се користи за рангирање на зборови од реченица, кои подоцна се заменуваат со користење стратегии за замена на зборови. Експериментално покажуваме дека нашиот пристап ги надминува другите методи на напад за неколку задачи за класификација на текст.', 'ms': 'Model belajar dalam susah terhadap contoh musuh yang mempunyai gangguan yang tidak dapat diterima dalam input asal, yang menyebabkan serangan musuh terhadap model ini. Analisi serangan ini pada pengubah seni di NLP boleh membantu meningkatkan kekuatan model ini melawan input musuh seperti itu. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan Adv-OLM, kaedah serangan kotak hitam yang menyesuaikan idea Model Occlusion and Language (OLM) kepada kaedah serangan seni semasa. OLM digunakan untuk menandai perkataan kalimat, yang kemudian diganti menggunakan strategi penggantian perkataan. Kami secara eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kami melampaui kaedah serangan lain untuk beberapa tugas klasifikasi teks.', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d എതിരാളികളുടെ ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് സംശയിക്കുന്നു. ആദ്യമായ ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്ന തരത്തില്\u200d ആദ NLP-ലെ കലാകാര്യ മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d ഈ ആക്രമണങ്ങളുടെ അന്വേഷണം ഇത്തരം എതിരാളിയുള്ള ഇന്\u200dപുറ്റുകള്\u200dക്കെതിരായി ഈ മോഡലു ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു കറുത്ത-ബോക്സ് ആക്രമണ രീതിയില്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. ഈ ആശയത്തിന്റെയും ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളുടെയും ആശയം ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ ആക്രമണരൂപത്തി ഒരു വാക്കിന്റെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതിന് ശേഷം വാക്ക് മാറ്റുന്നതിനുപകരം വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരീക്ഷണത്തില്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ അടുത്ത് മറ്റു ആക്രമണ രീതികള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പ', 'lt': 'Išsamaus mokymosi modeliai yra jautrūs prieštaringiems pavyzdžiams, kurie turi nemažų trikdžių pradiniame įvedime, dėl kurių prieštaringi išpuoliai prieš šiuos modelius. Analizuojant šiuos išpuolius prieš moderniausius NLP transformatorius, galima pagerinti šių modelių patikimumą prieš tokius priešingus įnašus. Šiame dokumente pristatome Adv-OLM, juodos dėžutės atakos metodą, pritaikantį okuliacijos ir kalbos modelių (OLM) idėją prie dabartinių pažangiausių atakos metodų. OLM klasifikuojami sakinio žodžiai, kurie vėliau pakeičiami žodžių pakeitimo strategijomis. We experimentally show that our approach outperforms other attack methods for several text classification tasks.', 'ka': 'ძალიან მასწავლის მოდელები არიან განატებარიალური მაგალითებისთვის, რომლებიც ორიგინალური მონაცემებში უნდა გავაკეთოთ პერტურბაციები, რომლებიც შეიძლება განატებარიალური ატაკები ანალიზია ამ მოდელების ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან გარდაქმნა განსხვავებების სტრანფიგურაციაზე NLP-ში. ამ დოკუმენტში ჩვენ Adv-OLM-ს გაჩვენებთ, შავი კონტაქტის ატატიკური მეტი, რომელიც Occlusion და Language Models (OLM) იდეოს მიმდინარე სურათის ატატიკური მეტისების მიმდინარე სტატი OLM იყენება სიტყვების სიტყვების რეგინტირებისთვის, რომელიც შემდეგ შეცვლა სიტყვების შეცვლის სტრატიგიებით. ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტიურად გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ჩვენი წარმოდგენა სხვა არაფექტის მეტოვები რამდენიმე ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციის დავალებისთვის', 'kk': 'Үлкен оқыту үлгілері бастапқы келтірілген қарсылық мысалдарға қатынасыз болады. Бұл үлгілердің қарсылық қарсылықтары болады. NLP-тың сурет түрлендірушілерінің күйінде бұл үлгілердің құндылығын өзгертуге көмектесе алады. Бұл қағазда Adv- OLM дегенді таңдаймыз. Бұл құжаттың "Occlusion and Language Models" (OLM) идеясын өзгерту әдістеріне қолдану арқылы қара және қара жұмыс әдістерін көрсетеді. OLM сөздерді сөздерді реттеу үшін қолданылады, оларды сөздерді алмастыру стратегиясы қолданып алмастырылады. Біз тәжірибелерді бірнеше мәтін классификациялау тапсырмаларының басқа атқару әдістерін жасайды.', 'mn': 'Гүн гүнзгий суралцах загварууд нь эхний оролцоонд зориулагддаггүй эсрэг жишээнээс хоригдож, тэдгээр загваруудын эсрэг эсрэг дайралт үүсгэдэг. NLP-ийн урлаг шилжүүлэгчдийн байр сууриллагуудын шинжилгээний талаар эдгээр загваруудын шинжилгээ ийм эсрэг өрсөлдөг оруулалтын эсрэг хүчтэй байдлыг сайжруулж чадна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид "Occlusion and Language Models" (OLM) санааг урлагийн дайрах аргын орчин үед зохион байгуулах аргыг хар хайрцаг хайрцах аргыг үзүүлнэ. OLM нь үгийн орлуулах стратегийг ашиглаж, дараа нь үгийг орлуулах үгийг хэлбэрээр ашигладаг. Бид туршилтын арга хэмжээний хэлбэрийн даалгаврын өөр арга замыг дамжуулдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Djupne læringsmodeller er sjølvhengig for adversariske eksemplar som har uavhengige perturbasjonar i den opprinnelige inndata, som fører til adversariske attackar mot desse modelane. Analysering av desse ataka på tilstanden til kunsttransformeringane i NLP kan hjelpa til å forbetra kraftigheten av desse modelane mot slike adversariske inndata. I denne papiret presenterer vi Adv-OLM, eit svart boks-attack-metode som tilpassar ideen om Okclusion og Språk-modeller (OLM) til den gjeldande tilstanden til kunstbruksmetodane. OLM vert brukt til å rekna ord på eit setning, som seinare vert erstatta med orderstattingsstrategiar. Vi viser eksperimentelt at tilnærminga vårt utfører andre brukmetodar for fleire tekstklassifikasjonar.', 'pl': 'Modele głębokiego uczenia są podatne na przykłady przeciwne, które mają niezauważalne zakłócenia w oryginalnym wejściu, co powoduje ataki przeciwko tym modelom. Analiza tych ataków na najnowocześniejsze transformatory w NLP może pomóc poprawić solidność tych modeli wobec takich wejść przeciwnych. W artykule przedstawiamy Adv-OLM, metodę ataku czarnej skrzynki, która dostosowuje ideę modeli okluzji i języka (OLM) do aktualnych metod ataku. OLM jest używany do rankingu słów zdania, które są później zastępowane za pomocą strategii zastępowania słów. Eksperymentalnie pokazujemy, że nasze podejście przewyższa inne metody ataku dla kilku zadań klasyfikacji tekstu.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli ta’ tagħlim profond huma suxxettibbli għal eżempji avversarji li għandhom perturbazzjonijiet imperċettivi fl-input oriġinali, li jirriżultaw f’attakki avversarji kontra dawn il-mudelli. Analysis of these attacks on the state of the art transformers in NLP can help improve the robustness of these models against such adversarial inputs.  In this paper, we present Adv-OLM, a black-box attack method that adapts the idea of Occlusion and Language Models (OLM) to the current state of the art attack methods.  L-OLM jintuża biex jikklassifika l-kliem ta’ sentenza, li aktar tard jiġu sostitwiti bl-użu ta’ strateġiji ta’ sostituzzjoni tal-kliem. Aħna juru b’mod sperimentali li l-approċċ tagħna jaqbeż metodi oħra ta’ attakk għal diversi kompiti ta’ klassifikazzjoni tat-test.', 'ro': 'Modelele de învățare profundă sunt susceptibile la exemple adversare care au perturbații imperceptibile în intrarea inițială, rezultând atacuri adversare împotriva acestor modele. Analiza acestor atacuri asupra transformatoarelor de ultimă generație în PNL poate ajuta la îmbunătățirea robusteții acestor modele împotriva unor astfel de intrări adversare. În această lucrare, prezentăm Adv-OLM, o metodă de atac cu cutie neagră care adaptează ideea modelelor de occlusiune și limbaj (OLM) la metodele actuale de atac de ultimă generație. OLM este folosit pentru a clasifica cuvintele unei propoziții, care sunt ulterior înlocuite folosind strategii de înlocuire a cuvintelor. Am arătat experimental că abordarea noastră depășește alte metode de atac pentru mai multe sarcini de clasificare a textului.', 'sr': 'Duboki modeli učenja su osjetljivi na neprijateljske primjere koji imaju neprihvatljive perturbacije u originalnom ulazu, što je rezultiralo neprijateljskim napadima protiv tih modela. Analiza tih napada na stanje umjetničkih transformatora u NLP-u može pomoći da poboljša robotu tih modela protiv takvih neprijateljskih ulaza. U ovom papiru predstavljamo Adv-OLM, metodu napada crne kutije koja prilagođuje ideju Okcluzija i jezičkih modela (OLM) trenutnom stanju metoda napada umetnosti. OLM se koristi za rečenje reči rečenice, koja se kasnije zamjenjuje koristeći strategije zamjene rečenica. Eksperimentalno pokazujemo da naš pristup iznosi druge metode napada za nekoliko zadataka za klasifikaciju teksta.', 'so': 'Tusaalada waxbarashada hoose waxay shaki ku leeyihiin tusaalayaasha cadaawayaasha ah, kuwaas oo sababtay dagaal ka gees ah tusaalahaas. Analysis ka mid ah attackadan xaalada beddelka farshaxanka ee NLP waxay caawin kartaa hagaajinta dabeecadaas ka geesta ah waxyaabaha ka geesta ah. Qoraalkan waxaan ku qornaa Adv-OLM, qaab weerar oo madow ah oo u sawiraa fikrada dhaqanka iyo muusikada luuqada (OLM) oo ku haboon xaalada dagaalka farshaxanka. OLM waxaa loo isticmaalaa in loo sareeyo hadal ereyga, taasoo ugu dambeeya lagu beddelo isticmaalka qoraalka hadalka beddelasha. Imtixaan baaritaanka waxaynu muujinnaa in dhaqdhaqaaqyadeenu uu sameeyo qaabab kale oo weerar ah oo loo sameynayo shaqooyin kala duduwan qoraal ah.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණය විරුද්ධ උදාහරණ වලට සැකසුම් වෙන්න පුළුවන් උදාහරණ වලින්, මුලින් ඇතුළු ඇතුලට අවශ්\u200dය වි NLP වලින් ඉන්තු වෙනස් කරුණාකරුවන්ගේ ස්ථානයේ මේ ප්\u200dරහාරයක් විශේෂ කරන්න පුළුවන් මේ මොඩේල්ස්ගේ ශක්තිමත් ව මේ පැත්තේ, අපි ඇව්ඩ්-OLM වෙනුවෙන්, කළු බොක්ස් ප්\u200dරහාරයක් විධානයක් තියෙනවා, ඒ වගේම ඔක්ක්ලොසියෝන් සහ භාෂා මොඩේල්ස OLM භාවිත වාක්යේ වචනයක් ස්ථානය කරන්න භාවිත වෙනවා, ඒක පස්සේ වචනයක් ස්ථානය කරන්න ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරන් අපි පරීක්ෂණයෙන් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශය අනිත් ප්\u200dරවේශන විදිහට පරීක්ෂණ විදිහට පරීක්ෂණ වැඩ', 'sv': 'Djupinlärningsmodeller är mottagliga för motstridiga exempel som har omärkliga störningar i den ursprungliga ingången, vilket resulterar i motstridiga attacker mot dessa modeller. Analys av dessa attacker på toppmoderna transformatorer i NLP kan bidra till att förbättra robustheten hos dessa modeller mot sådana motstridiga ingångar. I denna uppsats presenterar vi Adv-OLM, en svartboxattack metod som anpassar idén om Occlusion and Language Models (OLM) till dagens toppmoderna angreppsmetoder. OLM används för att rangordna ord i en mening, som senare ersätts med ordersättningsstrategier. Vi visar experimentellt att vårt tillvägagångssätt överträffar andra angreppsmetoder för flera textklassificeringsuppgifter.', 'ta': 'ஆழமான கற்றல் மாதிரிகள் எதிர்மறை உதாரணங்களுக்கு சந்தேகமாக இருக்கிறது முதல் உள்ளீட்டில் முற்றிலும் பிரச்சனைகள் இருக்கிறது, இந்த மாதி NLP-ல் கலை மாற்றங்கள் நிலையில் இந்த தாக்குகள் ஆராய்ச்சி இந்த மாதிரிகளுக்கு எதிரான உள்ளீடுகளை எதிராக மாற்ற முடியும். இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு கருப்பெட்டி தாக்கும் முறையை காண்பிக்கிறோம். அது தற்போதைய கலை தாக்கும் முறைமைகளில் உள்ள தற்போதைய நிலை Name நாங்கள் சோதனையில் காண்பிக்கிறோம் என்றால் எங்கள் அணுகும் மற்ற தாக்க முறைகளை செயல்படுத்தும் பல உரை வகுப', 'ur': 'عمیق سیکھنے کی مدل مخالف مثالوں کے ساتھ مضبوط ہیں جن کی اصلی داخل میں مضبوطی اڑانے کی ضرورت نہیں ہے اور ان مدلوں کے مقابلے میں مخالف حملہ کا نتیجہ ہوتا ہے. ان حملوں کی تحلیل NLP کے هنر تغییر کرنے والوں کی حالت پر یہ مدلکوں کی طاقت کو اس طرح مخالف اضافہ کے مقابلہ میں زیادتی کی مدد کر سکتی ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم اڈ-اول م کی نشانی دیتے ہیں، ایک سیاه باکس حملہ طریقہ جو اکلسیون اور زبان مدل (OLM) کی نظر کو آسان کرتا ہے، آرت حملہ طریقوں کے موجود حالت پر۔ OLM ایک جماعت کے کلمات کو درج کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے، جو اس کے بعد کلمات بدلنے کے استراتژی کے مطابق بدل دیا جاتا ہے. ہم آزمائش کے طور پر دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ مختلف ٹیکسٹ کلاسپیٹ کے کاموں کے لئے دوسرے حملہ طریقے سے کام کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "O'rganish modellari esa asl input ichida muvaffaqiyatlarga murakkablik bo'lgan masallardan foydalanadi. Bu modellardan foydalanuvchi harakatlar sababi. NLP shaxsiy o'zgarishlar holatida bu shaxsiyatlarni analyzer bu modellarning qo'shishni o'zgartirishga yordam beradi. Bu qogʻozda biz AQSH (OLM) kabi qora qutisi shamol usulini hozirgi sanat anglash usullarini moslash mumkin. Name Biz tajriba qilamiz, biz bir necha matn classification vazifalari uchun boshqa harakat usullarini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Các mô hình học sâu sắc dễ bị ảnh hưởng bởi những trường hợp có những phiền phức khó nhận thấy trong nội dung ban đầu, dẫn đến các cuộc tấn công đối nghịch. Phân tích các cuộc tấn công vào bộ máy biến đổi nghệ thuật ở Njala có thể giúp nâng cao độ bền vững của những mô hình này đối với những nội dung ngược nhau. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu Ad-OLM, một phương pháp tấn công hộp đen, thích ứng ý tưởng về Occlusion và Languals Models (OLM) với phương pháp tấn công nghệ thuật hiện thời. OLM được dùng để cấp bậc từ của một câu, mà sau này thay thế bằng cách dùng chiến lược thay thế từ. Chúng tôi thí nghiệm cho thấy cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi thực hiện các phương pháp tấn công khác cho nhiều nhiệm vụ phân loại văn bản.', 'bg': 'Моделите за дълбоко учене са податливи на съпернически примери, които имат незабележими смущения в първоначалния вход, което води до съпернически атаки срещу тези модели. Анализът на тези атаки върху най-съвременните трансформатори в НЛП може да помогне за подобряване на здравината на тези модели срещу такива контрагентни входове. В настоящата статия представяме метод за атака с черна кутия, който адаптира идеята за оклузионни и езикови модели (ОЛМ) към съвременните методи за атака. ОЛМ се използва за класиране на думи от изречение, които по-късно се заменят чрез стратегии за замяна на думи. Експериментално показваме, че нашият подход превъзхожда други методи за атака при няколко задачи по класификация на текста.', 'nl': 'Deep learning modellen zijn gevoelig voor tegenstrijdige voorbeelden die onwaarneembare verstoringen in de oorspronkelijke input hebben, resulterend in tegenstrijdige aanvallen op deze modellen. Analyse van deze aanvallen op de state-of-the-art transformatoren in NLP kan helpen de robuustheid van deze modellen tegen dergelijke tegenstrijdige ingangen te verbeteren. In dit artikel presenteren we Adv-OLM, een black-box aanvalsmethode die het idee van Occlusion and Language Models (OLM) aanpast aan de huidige state of the art aanvalsmethoden. OLM wordt gebruikt om woorden van een zin te rangschikken, die later worden vervangen door woordvervangingsstrategieën. We laten experimenteel zien dat onze aanpak beter presteert dan andere aanvalsmethoden voor verschillende tekstclassificatietaken.', 'hr': 'Duboki modeli učenja su osjetljivi na neprijateljske primjere koji imaju neprihvatljive perturbacije u originalnom ulazu, što je rezultiralo neprijateljskim napadima protiv tih modela. Analiza tih napada na stanje umjetničkih transformatora u NLP-u može pomoći poboljšati robotu tih modela protiv takvih neprijateljskih ulaganja. U ovom papiru predstavljamo Adv-OLM, metodu napada crne kutije koja prilagođuje ideju Okcluzija i jezičkih modela (OLM) trenutnom stanju metoda napada umjetnosti. OLM se koristi za ranking riječi rečenice, koja se kasnije zamjenjuju koristeći strategije zamjene riječi. Eksperimentalno pokazujemo da naš pristup iznosi druge metode napada za nekoliko zadataka klasifikacije teksta.', 'da': 'Deep learning modeller er modtagelige for modstridende eksempler, der har umærkelige forstyrrelser i det oprindelige input, hvilket resulterer i modstridende angreb på disse modeller. Analyse af disse angreb på de nyeste transformatorer i NLP kan bidrage til at forbedre robustheden af disse modeller mod sådanne modstridende input. I denne artikel præsenterer vi Adv-OLM, en black-box angrebsmetode, der tilpasser ideen om Occlusion and Language Models (OLM) til den aktuelle state of te art angrebsmetode. OLM bruges til at rangere ord i en sætning, som senere erstattes ved hjælp af orderstatningsstrategier. Vi viser eksperimentelt, at vores tilgang overgår andre angrebsmetoder til flere tekstklassifikationsopgaver.', 'de': 'Deep-Learning-Modelle sind anfällig für gegensätzliche Beispiele, die unmerkliche Störungen im ursprünglichen Input aufweisen, was zu feindlichen Angriffen auf diese Modelle führt. Die Analyse dieser Angriffe auf die State-of-the-Art Transformatoren in NLP kann dazu beitragen, die Robustheit dieser Modelle gegenüber solchen gegensätzlichen Eingängen zu verbessern. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir Adv-OLM vor, eine Black-Box-Angriffsmethode, die die Idee von Occlusion and Language Models (OLM) an den aktuellen Stand der Technik anpasst. OLM wird verwendet, um Wörter eines Satzes zu rangieren, die später durch Wortersatzstrategien ersetzt werden. Wir zeigen experimentell, dass unser Ansatz andere Angriffsmethoden für mehrere Textklassifizierungsaufgaben übertrifft.', 'fa': 'مدل یادگیری عمیق به مثالهای دشمنی احساس دارند که در ورودی اصلی تغییر قابل توجه ندارند، و به نتیجه حمله های دشمنی بر خلاف این مدل ها وجود دارد. تحلیل این حمله\u200cها بر وضعیت تغییردهنده\u200cهای هنری NLP می\u200cتواند کمک کند که قوت این مدل\u200cها بر خلاف این وسیله\u200cهای دشمنی تغییر دهند. در این کاغذ، ما روش حمله\u200cی جعبه سیاه\u200cپوست Adv-OLM را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که ایده\u200cی مدل\u200cهای اکلاسیون و زبان (OLM) را به حالت فعلی از روش حمله هنری adapt می\u200cکند. OLM برای تنظیم کردن کلمات یک جمله استفاده می\u200cشود، که بعد از استراتژی جایگزینی کلمات جایگزینی می\u200cشود. ما به طور آزمایشی نشان می دهیم که دستور ما روش های دیگر حمله را برای کارهای مخفی متن انجام می دهد.', 'id': 'Model belajar dalam susah untuk contoh musuh yang memiliki gangguan yang tidak terlihat dalam input asli, yang menyebabkan serangan musuh terhadap model ini. Analisi serangan ini pada penukar seni di NLP dapat membantu meningkatkan kekuatan model ini melawan masukan musuh seperti itu. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan Adv-OLM, metode serangan kotak hitam yang menyesuaikan ide Occlusion and Language Models (OLM) dengan metode serangan seni saat ini. OLM digunakan untuk mengatur kata-kata dari kalimat, yang kemudian diganti menggunakan strategi penggantian kata. Kami secara eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita melebihi metode serangan lain untuk beberapa tugas klasifikasi teks.', 'ko': '딥러닝 모델은 원본 입력에서 감지할 수 없는 교란을 일으켜 이 모델에 대한 적 공격을 초래하는 적 예에 쉽게 영향을 받는다.이러한 NLP 중 가장 선진적인 변압기에 대한 공격을 분석하면 이 모델들이 이 같은 적대적인 입력에 대한 노봉성을 향상시키는 데 도움이 된다.본고에서 우리는 Adv-OLM을 제기했는데 이것은 블랙박스 공격 방법으로 가리기와 언어모델(OLM)의 사상을 현재의 가장 선진적인 공격 방법과 결합시킨다.OLM 은 문장의 단어를 정렬한 다음 단어 대체 정책을 사용하여 대체하는 데 사용됩니다.우리의 실험은 여러 텍스트의 분류 임무에 대해 우리의 방법이 다른 공격 방법보다 우수하다는 것을 보여 주었다.', 'sw': 'Mradi wa kina wa kujifunza una mashaka kwa mifano yanayopingana na mifano ambayo ina matatizo yasiyoendelea katika kituo hicho cha awali, na kusababisha mashambulizi yanayopinga mifano haya. Uchambuzi wa mashambulizi haya kuhusu hali ya mabadiliko ya sanaa ya NLP yanaweza kusaidia kuboresha ustawi wa miundo hii dhidi ya matukio yanayopinga. Katika karatasi hii, tunawasilisha Adv-OLM, njia ya mashambulizi yenye meusi ambayo inabadilisha wazo la Uchunguzi na Utawala wa Lugha (OLM) kwa hali ya sasa ya mashambulizi ya sanaa. OLM inatumiwa kuweka maneno ya hukumu, ambayo baadae hubadilishwa kwa kutumia mbinu za kubadilisha maneno. Tunaonyesha kwa majaribio kwamba hatua yetu inafanya mbinu nyingine za mashambulizi kwa kazi kadhaa za usambazaji wa maandishi.', 'tr': "Derrew öwrenmek nusgalary täsirli mysallara üýtgeýän däldir. Bu nusgalar üçin täsirli salmaglar däldir. NLP'deki sungat transformatçylaryň durumynda bu uruşlaryň ýigrençylygynyň çykyşlygyny bejermek üçin kömek edip biler. Bu kagyzda Adv-OLM'i görkezip otyrýarys, Okclusiýa we Dil Modelleriniň (OLM) ideýasyny häzirki urut salyk yöntemleriniň durumyna süýtgeden kara-kuty salyk yöntemi. OLM sözleriň sözlerini pozmak üçin ullanýar, soňra sözleriň almak stratejiklerinden a şylýar. Biz experimental ýagdaýymyzyň birnäçe metin klasifikasy uzmanlary üçin başga atag yöntemlerini etmändigini görkeýäris.", 'af': "Deep leer modelles is aanvaardig na teenstandaarlike voorbeelde wat onvervaardige perturbasies in die oorspronklike invoer het, wat resultaat in teenstandaarlike atake teen hierdie modelles. Analiseer van hierdie atake op die staat van die kunstentransformeerders in NLP kan help die kragtigheid van hierdie modele verbeter teen sodanige teëstandige inpute. In hierdie papier, ons stel Adv-OLM voor 'n swart-boks aanval metode wat die idee van Occlusion en Taal Models (OLM) aanpas na die huidige staat van die kuns aanval metodes. OLM word gebruik om woorde van 'n seting te rank, wat later vervang word deur woord vervang strategies. Ons eksperimenteel wys dat ons toegang uitvoer ander atakmetode vir verskeie teks klassifikasie taak.", 'sq': 'Modelet e mësimit të thellë janë të ndjeshëm ndaj shembujve kundërshtarë që kanë shqetësime të padukshme në hyrjen origjinale, që rezultojnë në sulme kundërshtare kundër këtyre modeleve. Analiza e këtyre sulmeve ndaj transformuesve të gjendjes së teknologjisë në NLP mund të ndihmojë përmirësimin e fuqisë së këtyre modeleve kundër të tillave hyrjeve kundërshtare. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim Adv-OLM, një metodë sulmi me kuti të zezë që përshtat idenë e Ocklusion and Language Models (OLM) me metodat aktuale të sulmit më të mirë. OLM përdoret për të renditur fjalët e një fjale, të cilat më vonë zëvendësohen duke përdorur strategji zëvendësimi të fjalëve. Ne eksperimentalisht tregojmë se qasja jonë ekzekuton metoda të tjera sulmi për disa detyra klasifikuese teksti.', 'az': "Derin öyrənmə modelləri orijinal girişində müvafiq olmayan düşmənçilik məsəllərə müvafiq olaraq, bu modellərə qarşı düşmənçilik saldıqlarına bənzəyir. NLP-deki sanat transformatçıların durumu üzərində bu saldıqların analizi bu modellərin sərtliyini bu düşmənçilik inputlərinə qarşı daha qüvvətli tərzdə daha yaxınlaşdırmağa kömək edə bilər. Bu kağızda Adv-OLM'i göstərdik, sanat saldırma metodlarının hökmünün vəzifəsinə oxclusion və Dil Modellərinin ideyasını uygulayan siyah qutusu saldırma metodu. OLM sözlərini dəyişdirmək üçün istifadə edilir. Sonra sözlərin dəyişdirmək stratejiləri ilə əvəz olunar. Biz təcrübə edirik ki, bizim tərzimiz bir neçə mətn klasifikasiya işləri üçün başqa istifadə metodlarını başa düşər.", 'hy': 'Deep learning models are susceptible to adversarial examples that have imperceptible perturbations in the original input, resulting in adversarial attacks against these models.  ՆԼՊ-ի տեխնոլոգիական վերափոխողների վրա հարձակումների վերլուծությունը կարող է օգնել բարելավել այս մոդելների ուժեղությունը հակառակ նյութերի դեմ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք "Ավագ-ՕԼՄ"-ը, սևամորթ արկղի հարձակումների մեթոդ, որը հարմարեցնում է "Օկլազիա և լեզվի մոդելների" գաղափարը արվեստի հարձակումների ներկայիս մեթոդներին: ՕԼՄ-ը օգտագործվում է նախադասության բառերի դասակարգում, որոնք ավելի ուշ փոխարինվում են բառերի փոխարինման ռազմավարություններով: Մենք փորձարկումներով ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը գերազանցում է այլ հարձակումների մեթոդներ մի քանի տեքստի դասակարգման խնդիրների համար:', 'bn': 'গভীর শিক্ষার মডেল বিরোধী উদাহরণের জন্য সন্দেহজনক, যাদের প্রাথমিক ইনপুটের মধ্যে বিরুদ্ধে বিভ্রান্ত বিভ্রান্তিকর বিভ্রান্তি এনএলপির শিল্প পরিবর্তনের অবস্থায় এই আক্রমণের বিশ্লেষণ এনএলপির বিরুদ্ধে এই ধরনের বিরোধী প্রযুক্তির বিরুদ্ধে এই মডেলের রাস্ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা অ্যাডভ- ওলএম উপস্থাপন করছি, একটি কালো বাক্স আক্রমণ পদ্ধতি যা অক্লুশন এবং ভাষা মডেল (ওএলএম) চিন্তা বর্তমান শিল্প আক্রমণের পদ্ধত ওএলএম ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে একটি বাক্যের শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য, যা পরে শব্দ প্রতিস্থাপন কৌশল ব্যবহার করা হয়। We experimentally show that our approach outperforms other attack methods for several text classification tasks.', 'am': 'የጥልቅ ትምህርት ዓይነቶች በተቃዋሚ ምሳሌዎች የሚጠራጠሩ ናቸው፡፡ በNLP የዐርድ ልውወጥ ግንኙነት ላይ የዚህ ተቃዋሚ ጥያቄዎች የሞዴሎችን ጥብቅ ማሻሻል ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የጥቁር አካባቢ እና የቋንቋ ሞዴል (OLM) አካባቢ እና የአሁኑን የጥቁር አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ እና የቋንቋ አካሄዱን እና የአሁኑን የጥረት እንቅስቃሴን አቀናቅላለን፡፡ OLM የንግግር ቃላት እንዲያሳርፍ ተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ በተፈተና እናሳየዋለን የሥርዓታችን አካባቢ ሥርዓት ለብዙ ጽሑፎች መግለጫ ሥርዓቶችን እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'cs': 'Modely hlubokého učení jsou náchylné k příkladům, které mají nepozorovatelné poruchy v původním vstupu, což vede k nepřátelským útokům proti těmto modelům. Analýza těchto útoků na nejmodernější transformátory v NLP může pomoci zlepšit robustnost těchto modelů vůči takovým nepřátelským vstupům. V tomto článku představujeme Adv-OLM, metodu útoku černé skříňky, která přizpůsobuje myšlenku Occlusion and Language Models (OLM) současnému stavu útoků. OLM se používá k řazení slov věty, která jsou později nahrazena strategií nahrazení slov. Experimentálně ukazujeme, že náš přístup překonává ostatní metody útoku pro několik úloh klasifikace textu.', 'bs': 'Duboki modeli učenja su osjetljivi na neprijateljske primjere koji imaju neprihvatljive perturbacije u originalnom ulazu, što je rezultiralo neprijateljskim napadima protiv tih modela. Analiza tih napada na stanje umjetničkih transformatora u NLP-u može pomoći poboljšati robotu tih modela protiv takvih neprijateljskih ulaganja. U ovom papiru predstavljamo Adv-OLM, metodu napada crne kutije koja prilagođuje ideju Okcluzija i jezičkih modela (OLM) trenutnom stanju metoda napada umjetnosti. OLM se koristi za ranking riječi rečenice, koja se kasnije zamjenjuje koristeći strategije zamjene riječi. Eksperimentalno pokazujemo da naš pristup iznosi druge metode napada za nekoliko zadataka za klasifikaciju teksta.', 'ca': "Els models d'aprenentatge profund són susceptibles a exemples adversaris que tenen perturbacions imperceptibles en la entrada original, i que provoquen atacs adversaris contra aquests models. L'anàlisi d'aquests atacs contra els transformadors d'última generació de NLP pot ajudar a millorar la robustet d'aquests models en contra d'aquestes entrades adversaries. En aquest article presentem Adv-OLM, un mètode d'atac de caixa negra que adapta la idea de Models d'Occlusió i Llingua (OLM) als mètodes actuals d'atac més avançats. OLM s'utilitza per classificar paraules d'una frase, que després són substituïdes amb estratègies de substitució de paraules. Ens demostram experimentalment que el nostre enfocamentsupera altres mètodes d'atac per a diverses tasques de classificació de textos.", 'et': 'S체gav천ppe mudelid on vastuv천tlikud vastandlikele n채idetele, millel on algses sisendis m채rkamatud h채ired, mille tulemuseks on vastandlikud r체nnakud nende mudelite vastu. K천nealuste r체nnakute anal체체s uue t철철programmi tipptasemel trafode vastu v천ib aidata parandada nende mudelite vastupidavust selliste vastastikuste sisendite vastu. K채esolevas t철철s tutvustame Adv-OLM-i, musta kasti r체nnakumeetodit, mis kohandab oklusiooni ja keelemudelite (OLM) ideed praeguse tehnika r체nnakumeetoditega. OLM-i kasutatakse lause s천nade j채rjestamiseks, mis hiljem asendatakse s천navahetusstrateegiatega. Eksperimentaalselt n채itame, et meie l채henemine on mitmete tekstiklassifitseerimis체lesannete puhul 체le teiste r체nnakumeetodite.', 'fi': 'Syväoppimismallit ovat alttiita kontrastiaalisille esimerkeille, joilla on huomaamattomia häiriöitä alkuperäisessä syötteessä, mikä johtaa kontrastiaalisiin hyökkäyksiin näitä malleja vastaan. Näiden NLP:n uusimpiin muuntajiin kohdistuvien hyökkäysten analysointi voi auttaa parantamaan näiden mallien kestävyyttä tällaisia vastakkaisia syöttöjä vastaan. Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme Adv-OLM:n, mustan laatikon hyökkäysmenetelmän, joka mukauttaa Occlusion and Language Models (OLM) -idean nykyajan hyökkäysmenetelmiin. OLM:llä tarkoitetaan lauseen sanoja, jotka korvataan myöhemmin sanankorotusstrategioilla. Kokeellisesti osoitamme, että lähestymistapamme ylittää muut hyökkäysmenetelmät useissa tekstiluokittelutehtävissä.', 'ha': "Ana shakka da misãlai masu motsi da ke cikin shirin ayuka na farko, don su sami attacki masu motsi a kan waɗannan. Ana yi anayyar cikin wannan attacki kan halin musanya na sanar da ke cikin NLP, yana iya ƙarfafa zane-zane masu motsi kan masu motsi. Ga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da Adv-OLM, wata hanyor shawarar-baƙo mai baƙi wanda ke adadi fikon shirin ayuka na Kwamfyuta da Lugha (OLM) zuwa halin da ke kai yanzu na zayen shawarar. Ana amfani da OLM dõmin a danna maganar wata magana, da za'a bada da shi a bayan su yi amfani da bakin sigar magana. Tuna nũna cewa hanyoyinmu yana samar da wasu hanyoyin bakwai na aikin misalin misãlai masu daraja.", 'he': 'דוגמאות למידה עמוקה רגישות לדוגמאות יריבות שיש להן הפרעות בלתי רגישות בתכנית המקורית, מה שמוביל לתקפות יריבות נגד דוגמאות אלה. ניתוח התקפות האלה על המעברים המאומנים של NLP יכול לעזור לשפר את החזקה של הדוגמנים האלה נגד תוכניות נוגדיות כאלה. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים את Adv-OLM, שיטת התקפה בקופסה שחורה שמתאימה את הרעיון של מודלים של התקפה והשפה (OLM) לשיטות המצב הנוכחי של התקפה האמנותית. OLM משתמש כדי לדרג מילים של משפט, שמתחליפים מאוחר יותר באמצעות אסטרטגיות מחליפה מילים. אנו מראים מבחינה ניסיונית שהגישה שלנו מעלית שיטות תקיפה אחרות עבור מספר משימות מסווג טקסט.', 'sk': 'Modeli globokega učenja so dovzetni za kontradikcijske primere, ki imajo neopazne motnje v prvotnem vnosu, kar povzroči kontradikcijske napade na te modele. Analiza teh napadov na najsodobnejše transformatorje v NLP lahko pomaga izboljšati robustnost teh modelov proti takšnim nasprotnim vhodom. V prispevku predstavljamo Adv-OLM, metodo napada v črni škatli, ki prilagaja idejo okluzijskih in jezikovnih modelov (OLM) aktualnim najsodobnejšim metodam napada. OLM se uporablja za razvrščanje besed stavka, ki se kasneje nadomestijo s strategijami zamenjave besed. Eksperimentalno dokazujemo, da naš pristop presega druge metode napada pri več nalogah klasifikacije besedila.', 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop Anali perusahaan kanggo nganggo perusahaan kanggo nguasai perusahaan kanggo ingkang NLP iki bakal bantuan ngono nggawe nguasai perusahaan model iki ngono sak inputs yang pakan karo koyo opo-pakan. In this paper, we present Adv-OlM, a red-box effect method that Adjusts the idée of Okclution and Language Modes (OlM) to the current state of the arts strike method. EMAIL Awak dhéwé éntuk ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno tentang nggawe ngerasakno', 'bo': 'Deep learning models are susceptible to adversarial examples that have imperceptible perturbations in the original input, resulting in adversarial attacks against these models. NLP ནང་གི་སྒྱུ་རྩལ་གཞུང་བཟོ་བྱེད་མཁན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་བཅས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་བ་དག་གི་དབྱེ་བ་དག་གི་སྐྱེལ་ཚད་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང In this paper, we present Adv-OLM, a black-box attack method that adapts the idea of Occlusion and Language Models (OLM) to the current state of the art attack methods. OLM འདི་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོས་ལག་འཁྱེར་སྟངས་བྱས་ན་ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་རིས་ཡིག་གི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་གཞན་ཞིག་ལ་བཟུང་བ་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'Leveraging Passage Retrieval with Generative Models for Open Domain Question Answering', 'ar': 'الاستفادة من استرجاع الممر مع النماذج التوليدية للإجابة على أسئلة المجال المفتوح', 'pt': 'Aproveitando a recuperação de passagem com modelos generativos para resposta a perguntas de domínio aberto', 'fr': 'Tirer parti de la récupération de passages avec des modèles génératifs pour répondre aux questions de domaine ouvert', 'es': 'Aprovechamiento de la recuperación de pasajes con modelos generativos para la respuesta a preguntas de dominio abierto', 'zh': '因生成道检索开放域问答', 'ja': 'オープンドメインの質問への回答のための生成モデルを使用した経路検索の活用', 'hi': 'खुला डोमेन प्रश्न उत्तर देने के लिए उत्पादक मॉडल के साथ मार्ग पुनर्प्राप्ति का लाभ उठाना', 'ru': 'Использование извлечения пассажа с генеративными моделями для ответов на вопросы открытого домена', 'ga': 'Aisghabháil Pasáiste a Ghiaráil le Múnlaí Gineadacha le haghaidh Freagra ar Cheisteanna Fearainn Oscailte', 'el': 'Αξιοποίηση ανάκτησης διαβατηρίων με γενόσημα μοντέλα για την απάντηση ερωτήσεων ανοικτού τομέα', 'hu': 'A generált modellek segítségével nyílt domain kérdések megválaszolásához használható átjárási lehetőségek kihasználása', 'ka': 'გახსნა დომენის კითხვის გასაგებისთვის დასრულება მოდელთან დასრულება', 'it': 'Sfruttare il recupero dei passaggi con modelli generativi per la risposta alle domande di dominio aperto', 'kk': 'Ашылған домен сұрақтарының жауап беру үшін жасау үлгілері бар пассажасын алу', 'lt': 'Keleivių gavimo didinimas naudojant atviro domeno klausimų atsakymo generuotuosius modelius', 'mk': 'Разголемување на преземањето на патиштата со генеративни модели за отворени одговори на прашањата на доменот', 'ml': 'തുറന്ന ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള പാസ്സേജ് വീണ്ടെടുക്കുന്നു', 'ms': 'Menegang Pemulihan Laluan dengan Model Generatif untuk Jawapan soalan Domain Buka', 'mt': 'L-estensjoni tal-kisba tal-passiġġieri b’Mudelli Ġenerattivi għat-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet tad-dominju miftuħ', 'mn': 'Нээлтэй Домен асуултын хариултын төлөвлөгөө бүтээлч загваруудыг авч авах', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie odzyskiwania pasażu z modelami generacyjnymi do odpowiedzi na pytania otwarte w domenie', 'no': 'Tilbakestill passasjon med genererte modeller for å svara på opna domenespørsmål', 'ro': 'Utilizarea recuperării pasajelor cu modele generative pentru răspunsul la întrebări deschise de domeniu', 'sr': 'Prikupljanje prolaza sa generivnim modelima za odgovor na pitanje otvorene domene', 'so': 'Retrieval of Passage with Generative Models for Open Domain Questions', 'ta': 'திறந்த டொமைன் கேள்வி பதில்', 'ur': 'کھولنے ڈومین سوال جواب کے لئے جواب کے مطابق جواب کے مطابق مخلوقات موڈل کے ساتھ پاسج پھیر لیونڈ', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් විවෘත වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් සමග සිද්ධිය මඩේල් එක', 'sv': 'Utnyttja passagehämtning med generativa modeller för svar på frågor med öppen domän', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Đang dò hỏi cấp độ với các mẫu tạo rộng cho câu hỏi Miền rộng mở', 'bg': 'Използване на извличане на пасаж с генеративни модели за отговор на въпроси с отворен домейн', 'nl': 'Gebruik maken van Passage Retrieval met generatieve modellen voor het beantwoorden van open domeinvragen', 'da': 'Udnyttelse af passagehentning med genererede modeller til besvarelse af spørgsmål om åbent domæne', 'hr': 'Povlačenje prolaza s generivnim modelima za odgovor na pitanje otvorenog domena', 'id': 'Meningkatkan Penerimaan Passage dengan Model Generatif untuk Jawaban Pertanyaan Domain Buka', 'fa': 'بازیابی مسیر با مدل نسل برای پاسخ سوال دامنی باز', 'de': 'Nutzung der Passage Retrieval mit generativen Modellen zur Beantwortung offener Fragen', 'ko': '생성 모델을 바탕으로 하는 글 검색이 개방 영역 퀴즈에서의 응용', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'Leveraging Passage Retrieval with Generative Models for Open Domain Question Answering', 'sw': 'Leveraging Passage Retrieval with Generative Models for Open Domain Question Answering', 'tr': 'Aç domena soragy jogaplamak üçin janlaşdyrma modleri bilen süýtgetmek', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'A칞캼q Domain sual캼na cavab verm톛k 칲칞칲n Generik Modell톛ri il톛 istifad톛 edilir', 'bn': 'খোলা ডোমেইন প্রশ্নের উত্তর', 'ca': 'Ampliar la recuperació de passatges amb Models Generatius per respondre a preguntes de domini obert', 'sq': 'Duke zgjeruar marrjen e pasazhit me modele gjenerative për përgjigjet e hapura të pyetjeve të domenit', 'fi': 'Hyödynnä kulkuväylän noutoa yleisten mallien avulla avoimen verkkotunnuksen kysymysvastausta varten', 'et': 'Avatud domeeni küsimustele vastamise generatiivsete mudelite kasutamine', 'bs': 'Povlačenje prolaza sa generivnim modelima za odgovor na pitanje otvorenog domena', 'cs': 'Vyu탑it챠 z챠sk찼v찼n챠 pas찼탑챠 s genera훾n챠mi modely pro zodpov휎zen챠 ot찼zek otev힂en챕 dom챕ny', 'he': 'Leveraging Passage Retrieval with Generative Models for Open Domain Question Answering', 'sk': 'Izkoriščanje pridobivanja prehodov z generativnimi modeli za odgovarjanje na vprašanja odprte domene', 'jv': 'Language', 'ha': 'Media controller element', 'bo': 'ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་དྲ་ཁོངས་ལ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་མཐུད་སྣུམ་ཚོགས་ལུས་མཐུན་རྗེས་བྱེད་མི་ཐུབ་པ'}
{'en': 'Generative models for open domain question answering have proven to be competitive, without resorting to external knowledge. While promising, this approach requires to use models with billions of parameters, which are expensive to train and query. In this paper, we investigate how much these models can benefit from retrieving text passages, potentially containing evidence. We obtain state-of-the-art results on the Natural Questions and TriviaQA open benchmarks. Interestingly, we observe that the performance of this method significantly improves when increasing the number of retrieved passages. This is evidence that sequence-to-sequence models offers a flexible framework to efficiently aggregate and combine evidence from multiple passages.', 'ar': 'أثبتت النماذج التوليدية للإجابة على أسئلة المجال المفتوح أنها تنافسية ، دون اللجوء إلى المعرفة الخارجية. على الرغم من أن هذا النهج واعد ، إلا أنه يتطلب استخدام نماذج بمليارات من المعلمات ، وهي مكلفة للتدريب والاستعلام. في هذه الورقة ، نتحرى إلى أي مدى يمكن أن تستفيد هذه النماذج من استرجاع مقاطع نصية ، يحتمل أن تحتوي على أدلة. نحصل على أحدث النتائج في المعايير المفتوحة للأسئلة الطبيعية و TriviaQA. ومن المثير للاهتمام أننا نلاحظ أن أداء هذه الطريقة يتحسن بشكل كبير عند زيادة عدد المقاطع المسترجعة. هذا دليل على أن نماذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل توفر إطارًا مرنًا لتجميع الأدلة ودمجها بكفاءة من مقاطع متعددة.', 'pt': 'Modelos generativos de resposta a perguntas de domínio aberto têm se mostrado competitivos, sem recorrer ao conhecimento externo. Embora promissora, essa abordagem requer o uso de modelos com bilhões de parâmetros, que são caros para treinar e consultar. Neste artigo, investigamos o quanto esses modelos podem se beneficiar da recuperação de passagens de texto, potencialmente contendo evidências. Obtemos resultados de última geração nos benchmarks abertos Natural Questions e TriviaQA. Curiosamente, observamos que o desempenho desse método melhora significativamente ao aumentar o número de passagens recuperadas. Esta é uma evidência de que os modelos de sequência a sequência oferecem uma estrutura flexível para agregar e combinar eficientemente evidências de várias passagens.', 'fr': "Les modèles génératifs de réponse aux questions de domaine ouvert se sont révélés compétitifs, sans avoir recours à des connaissances externes. Bien que prometteuse, cette approche nécessite l'utilisation de modèles comportant des milliards de paramètres, qui sont coûteux à entraîner et à interroger. Dans cet article, nous étudions dans quelle mesure ces modèles peuvent bénéficier de la récupération de passages de texte, contenant potentiellement des preuves. Nous obtenons des résultats de pointe sur les tests de référence ouverts Natural Questions et TriviaQA. Il est intéressant de noter que les performances de cette méthode s'améliorent considérablement lorsque l'on augmente le nombre de passages récupérés. Cela prouve que les modèles séquence à séquence offrent un cadre flexible pour agréger et combiner efficacement les preuves issues de multiples passages.", 'es': 'Los modelos generativos de respuesta a preguntas de dominio abierto han demostrado ser competitivos, sin recurrir a conocimientos externos. Si bien es prometedor, este enfoque requiere el uso de modelos con miles de millones de parámetros, que son costosos de entrenar y consultar. En este artículo, investigamos cuánto se pueden beneficiar estos modelos al recuperar fragmentos de texto que podrían contener evidencia. Obtenemos resultados de vanguardia en los puntos de referencia abiertos de Preguntas Naturales y TriviAQA. Curiosamente, observamos que el rendimiento de este método mejora significativamente al aumentar el número de pasajes recuperados. Esto demuestra que los modelos de secuencia a secuencia ofrecen un marco flexible para agregar y combinar de manera eficiente la evidencia de múltiples pasajes.', 'ja': 'オープンドメインの質問に答えるための生成モデルは、外部の知識に頼ることなく、競争力があることが証明されています。有望ですが、このアプローチでは、トレーニングやクエリに費用がかかる、数十億のパラメータを持つモデルを使用する必要があります。この論文では、これらのモデルが、証拠を含む可能性のあるテキストのパッセージを取得することによってどれだけ利益を得ることができるかを調査します。ナチュラルクエスチョンとTriviaQAオープンベンチマークで最先端の結果を得ることができます。興味深いことに、この方法の性能は、回収された経路の数を増加させるときに著しく向上することが観察される。これは、配列間シーケンスモデルが、複数の経過からのエビデンスを効率的に集約および結合するための柔軟なフレームワークを提供することを示す証拠である。', 'zh': '所以开域问答生成模形已证有竞争力,而无告诸外知。 虽有希望,然须用数十亿参数模样,其参数训询本高。 于本文中,究此模则检索文本段落中受益多少,文本段落可包证也。 开TriviaQA得先进。 有趣者,吾观之,当增检段落数,其性能显。 此证明序列于序列模型供一灵框架,可以合数段落之证也。', 'hi': 'खुले डोमेन प्रश्न का उत्तर देने के लिए उत्पादक मॉडल बाहरी ज्ञान का सहारा लिए बिना प्रतिस्पर्धी साबित हुए हैं। वादा करते समय, इस दृष्टिकोण को अरबों मापदंडों के साथ मॉडल का उपयोग करने की आवश्यकता होती है, जो प्रशिक्षित करने और क्वेरी करने के लिए महंगे हैं। इस पेपर में, हम जांच करते हैं कि इन मॉडलों को पाठ मार्ग को पुनर्प्राप्त करने से कितना लाभ हो सकता है, संभावित रूप से सबूत शामिल हैं। हम प्राकृतिक प्रश्नों और सामान्य ज्ञानQA खुले बेंचमार्क पर अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त करते हैं। दिलचस्प बात यह है कि, हम देखते हैं कि पुनर्प्राप्त मार्गों की संख्या में वृद्धि करते समय इस विधि के प्रदर्शन में काफी सुधार होता है। यह इस बात का सबूत है कि अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल कई मार्गों से साक्ष्य को कुशलतापूर्वक एकत्रित करने और संयोजित करने के लिए एक लचीला ढांचा प्रदान करता है।', 'ru': 'Генеративные модели ответов на открытые вопросы доказали свою конкурентоспособность, не прибегая к внешним знаниям. Хотя такой подход является многообещающим, он требует использования моделей с миллиардами параметров, которые являются дорогостоящими для обучения и запроса. В этой статье мы исследуем, насколько эти модели могут выиграть от извлечения текстовых отрывков, потенциально содержащих доказательства. Мы получаем самые современные результаты по открытым бенчмаркингам Natural Questions и TriviaQA. Интересно отметить, что производительность данного метода значительно улучшается при увеличении количества извлекаемых отрывков. Это доказывает, что модели последовательности-последовательности предлагают гибкую структуру для эффективной агрегирования и объединения доказательств из нескольких отрывков.', 'ga': 'Tá sé cruthaithe go bhfuil na samhlacha giniúna le haghaidh freagra na gceisteanna oscailte iomaíoch, gan dul i muinín eolas seachtrach. Cé go bhfuil sé geallta, éilíonn an cur chuige seo samhlacha a úsáid le billiúin paraiméadair, atá costasach le hoiliúint agus le fiosrú. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid imscrúdú ar cé chomh mór agus is féidir leis na samhlacha seo leas a bhaint as sleachta téacs a aisghabháil, a bhféadfadh fianaise a bheith iontu. Faighimid torthaí den scoth ar thagarmharcanna oscailte Ceisteanna Nádúrtha agus TriviaQA. Suimiúil go leor, tugaimid faoi deara go bhfeabhsaítear feidhmíocht an mhodha seo go suntasach nuair a mhéadaítear líon na n-aisghabháil pasanna. Is fianaise é seo go dtugann samhlacha seicheamh-go-seicheamh creat solúbtha chun fianaise ó ilchodanna a chomhiomlánú agus a chomhcheangal go héifeachtach.', 'el': 'Τα γενόσημα μοντέλα απάντησης σε ερωτήσεις ανοικτού τομέα έχουν αποδειχθεί ανταγωνιστικά, χωρίς να καταφεύγουν σε εξωτερικές γνώσεις. Ενώ υποσχόμενη, αυτή η προσέγγιση απαιτεί τη χρήση μοντέλων με δισεκατομμύρια παραμέτρους, οι οποίες είναι ακριβές στην εκπαίδευση και την αναζήτηση. Σε αυτή την εργασία, διερευνούμε πόσο αυτά τα μοντέλα μπορούν να ωφεληθούν από την ανάκτηση αποσπασμάτων κειμένου, που ενδεχομένως περιέχουν αποδεικτικά στοιχεία. Λαμβάνουμε αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σχετικά με τα φυσικά ερωτήματα και τα ανοικτά κριτήρια αναφοράς. Ενδιαφέρον είναι ότι παρατηρούμε ότι η απόδοση αυτής της μεθόδου βελτιώνεται σημαντικά όταν αυξάνεται ο αριθμός των ανακτηθέντων περάσεων. Αυτό είναι απόδειξη ότι τα μοντέλα αλληλουχίας σε αλληλουχίας προσφέρουν ένα ευέλικτο πλαίσιο για την αποτελεσματική συγκέντρωση και τον συνδυασμό αποδεικτικών στοιχείων από πολλαπλά αποσπάσματα.', 'hu': 'A nyílt domain kérdések megválaszolására szolgáló generációs modellek versenyképesnek bizonyultak, anélkül, hogy külső tudást igényelnénk. Bár ígéretes, ez a megközelítés megköveteli, hogy több milliárd paramétert tartalmazó modelleket használjon, amelyek drága a képzés és lekérdezés. Ebben a tanulmányban azt vizsgáljuk, hogy ezek a modellek mennyire hasznosak lehetnek a szövegrészek visszakereséséből, amelyek potenciálisan bizonyítékokat tartalmaznak. A természetes kérdések és a TriviaQA nyitott referenciaértékek korszerű eredményeit kapjuk. Érdekes módon megfigyelhetjük, hogy ennek a módszernek a teljesítménye jelentősen javul, ha növeli a visszakeresett járatok számát. Ez bizonyíték arra, hogy a sorozat-sorozat modellek rugalmas keretet kínálnak a több részből származó bizonyítékok hatékony összesítésére és kombinálására.', 'ka': 'გახსნილი დიომინის კითხვის პასუხისთვის განვითარებული მოდელები გამოწვება კონკრენტიგურია, გარეშე ცნობილებისთვის გარეშე. მილიარდი პარამეტრების გამოყენება, რომლებიც ძალიან ძალიან საჭირო და კითხვა. ამ წიგნაში, ჩვენ შევხედავთ, რამდენიმე ეს მოდელები შეუძლიათ ტექსტის გარეშე, რომელიც შეიძლია გამოიყენება ტექსტის გარეშე, რომელიც შეიძლია ჩვენ მივიღეთ ნაირადი კითხვების და TriviaQA გახსნილი ბანქმების შესახებ. საინტერესოდ, ჩვენ დავხედავთ, რომ ეს პროცემის შესაძლებლობა მნიშვნელოვანად უფრო მეტია, როდესაც მიღებული წინაღების რაოდენობა უფრო მეტია. ეს არის წარმოდგენები, რომ მოდელები წარმოდგენებს ძალიან გრძნობელი ფრამეტრი, რომელიც ეფექტიურად აგგრეგენ და შემბობენ წარმოდგენები მრავალ გადასვლებიდა', 'it': "I modelli generativi per la risposta a domande open domain si sono dimostrati competitivi, senza ricorrere a conoscenze esterne. Sebbene promettente, questo approccio richiede di utilizzare modelli con miliardi di parametri, che sono costosi da addestrare e interrogare. In questo articolo, esaminiamo quanto questi modelli possono trarre beneficio dal recupero di passaggi di testo, potenzialmente contenenti prove. Otteniamo risultati all'avanguardia sui benchmark aperti Natural Questions e TriviaQA. È interessante notare che le prestazioni di questo metodo migliorano significativamente aumentando il numero di passaggi recuperati. Ciò dimostra che i modelli sequenza-sequenza offrono un quadro flessibile per aggregare e combinare efficacemente le prove provenienti da più passaggi.", 'lt': 'Atviros srities klausimų atsakymo generaciniai modeliai pasirodė konkurencingi, nesinaudojant išorės žiniomis. Nors šis metodas yra perspektyvus, reikia naudoti milijardus parametrų turinčius modelius, kurie yra brangūs mokymui ir paklausai. Šiame dokumente mes tiriame, kiek šių modelių nauda gali būti gaunama iš tekstinių dalių, kuriose gali būti įrodymų. Gavome naujausius gamtinių klausimų ir TriviaQA atvirų lyginamųjų rodiklių rezultatus. Įdomu pastebėti, kad šio metodo veiksmingumas gerokai pagerėja didinant surinktų kelių skaičių. Tai įrodymai, kad iš eilės į eilę modeliai suteikia lanksčią sistemą veiksmingai surinkti ir derinti įrodymus iš kelių perėjimų.', 'kk': 'Ашылған домен сұрақтарының жауап беру үшін жасау үлгілері сыртқы білімдерге көмектеспей тұрады. Бұл жағдай миллиардық параметрлердің үлгілерін қолдану керек, олар оқыту және сұраныс үшін бағатты. Бұл қағазда, бұл үлгілер мәтін пайдаланушыларын алу үшін қанша мүмкіндігін зерттейміз. Біз табиғи сұрақтар мен TriviaQA ашық бағдарламаларының күй- жай нәтижелерін аламыз. Бұл әдістердің істеуі қажетті болғанда, қалпына келтірілген пайдаланулардың санын өзгерткенде өте жақсы болады. Бұл - реттеу үлгілерінің бірнеше пайдаланушыдан бөлек және бірнеше параметрлерді біріктіру үшін гибсикалық қоршауын ұсынады.', 'ms': 'Model generatif untuk menjawab soalan domain terbuka telah terbukti bersaing, tanpa menggunakan pengetahuan luaran. While promising, this approach requires to use models with billions of parameters, which are expensive to train and query.  Dalam kertas ini, kami menyelidiki berapa banyak model ini boleh berguna daripada mengambil laluan teks, yang berpotensi mengandungi bukti. Kami mendapat keputusan terbaik pada soalan alam dan triviaQA benchmarks terbuka. Menarik, kita memperhatikan bahawa prestasi kaedah ini meningkat dengan signifikan apabila meningkat bilangan laluan yang diterima. Ini adalah bukti bahawa model jujukan-ke-jujukan menawarkan kerangka fleksibel untuk mengumpulkan dan menggabungkan bukti dari beberapa laluan.', 'mk': 'Генеративните модели за отворено одговорување на прашањата на доменот се докажаа дека се конкурентни, без користење на надворешно знаење. И покрај ветувањето, овој пристап бара да се користат модели со милијарди параметри, кои се скапи за обука и прашање. Во овој весник, истражуваме колку овие модели можат да имаат корист од преземањето текстови, потенцијално содржејќи докази. Добиваме најдобри резултати за природните прашања и отворени резултати на ТривијаQA. Интересно е што забележуваме дека резултатот на овој метод значително се подобрува кога се зголемува бројот на преземени премини. Ова е доказ дека моделите од секвенца до секвенца нудат флексибилна рамка за ефикасно агрегирање и комбинација на докази од повеќе премини.', 'ml': 'തുറന്ന ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രധാന മോഡലുകള്\u200d പുറത്തുള്ള അറിവിനെ ഉപയോഗിക്കാതെ  വാഗ്ദാനം ചെയ്യുന്ന സമയത്ത്, ബില്ല്യണ്\u200d അളവുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കേണ്ടതുണ്ട്. പരിശീലനം ചെയ്യ In this paper, we investigate how much these models can benefit from retrieving text passages, potentially containing evidence.  സ്വാഭാവികമായ ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെയും ട്രിവിയാക്യൂവിയയുടെയും തുറന്ന ബെന്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്കുകളുടെയും സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് കലാ രസകരമായി, ഈ രീതിയുടെ പ്രകടനം പിന്തിരിക്കപ്പെട്ട പാസ്സുകളുടെ എണ്ണം വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d വളരെ പ്രധാനപ്പ ഇത് തെളിവുകളാണ് സെക്കന്\u200dസ്-ട്രോ-സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഒരു ഫ്ലാക്സിബിള്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നത്. കൂടുതല്\u200d പാസേജുകള', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli ġenerattivi għat-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet f’dominju miftuħ urew li huma kompetittivi, mingħajr ma rrikorru għall-għarfien estern. Filwaqt li huwa promettenti, dan l-approċċ jeħtieġ li jintużaw mudelli b’biljuni ta’ parametri, li jiswew ħafna għat-taħriġ u l-mistoqsijiet. F’dan id-dokument, ninvestigaw kemm dawn il-mudelli jistgħu jibbenefikaw mill-kisba ta’ passaġġi tat-test, li potenzjalment fihom evidenza. Aħna nkisbu riżultati l-aktar avvanzati dwar il-mistoqsijiet naturali u l-punti ta’ riferiment miftuħa TriviaQA. Interessanti, ninsabu li l-prestazzjoni ta’ dan il-metodu titjieb b’mod sinifikanti meta jiżdied in-numru ta’ passaġġi rkuprati. This is evidence that sequence-to-sequence models offers a flexible framework to efficiently aggregate and combine evidence from multiple passages.', 'pl': 'Generacyjne modele odpowiedzi na pytania otwarte w domenie okazały się konkurencyjne, bez uciekania się do wiedzy zewnętrznej. Chociaż podejście to obiecuje, wymaga stosowania modeli o miliardach parametrów, które są kosztowne w treningu i zapytaniu. W niniejszym artykule badamy, jak bardzo te modele mogą korzystać z odzyskiwania fragmentów tekstowych, potencjalnie zawierających dowody. Otrzymujemy najnowocześniejsze wyniki dotyczące naturalnych pytań i otwartych punktów odniesienia TriviaQA. Co ciekawe, obserwujemy, że wydajność tej metody znacznie poprawia się przy zwiększaniu liczby odzyskanych przejść. Jest to dowód na to, że modele sekwencji do sekwencji oferują elastyczne ramy do skutecznego agregowania i łączenia dowodów z wielu fragmentów.', 'no': 'Genererte modeller for oppgjevne domenespørsmål har vist å vera konkurrentivt, utan å korta til eksterne kunnskap. Dette tilnærminga må bruka modeller med milliarder parametra, som er dykka for å trenja og spørja. I denne papiret undersøker vi kor mykje disse modelane kan nytte for å henta tekstpassar, som potensielt inneheld beviser. Vi får resultat av kunsten på naturspørsmålene og TriviaQA-opne benchmarke. I interessant måte vi observerer at utviklinga av denne metoden er betydelig forbetra når det aukar talet på henta passar. Dette er bevise at sekvens-til-sekvensmodeller tilbyr ein fleksibel rammeverk for å effektivt aggrega og kombinere beviser frå fleire passar.', 'mn': 'Дэлхийн асуултын хариултын бүтээлч загварууд нь гадаад мэдлэгтэй холбогдохгүй өрсөлдөгч байдаг. Энэ арга зам нь хэдэн тэрбум параметрлүүдтэй загварыг ашиглах шаардлагатай. Энэ арга зам нь суралцах, Querying-д үнэтэй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид эдгээр загваруудын хэр хэмжээ ашигтай вэ гэдгийг судалж байна. Энэ загваруудын хувьд баталгаа агуулдаг. Бид Байгалийн асуултууд болон ТривияQA нээлттэй хэмжээсүүд дээр урлагийн үр дүнг авдаг. Хамгийн сонирхолтой нь, бид энэ аргын үйл ажиллагааны үр дүнг хүлээн зөвшөөрөх үед маш чухал сайжруулдаг гэдгийг анзаарсан. Энэ бол дарааллаас дарааллаар давтагдсан загварууд олон давтагдсан баталгааг үр дүнтэй нийлүүлэх болон нийлүүлэх боломжтой гишүүн хэмжээг өгдөг.', 'so': "Tusaale abuur ah oo u jawaabta su'aalaha furan ee domain waxay caddaadeen inay is-adag tahay, iyadoon isticmaalin aqoonta dibadda ah. Markii loo ballanqaaday, qaababkan waxaa loo baahan yahay in lagu isticmaalo tusaale bilyan parameter, kuwaas oo qaali ah in la baro iyo la weydiiyo. Warqadan waxaynu ka baaraynaa in tusaalahan ay faa’iido ka heli karto helitaanka baasaboorada qoraalka, waxaana suurtagal ah inay ku jirto caddeyn. We obtain state-of-the-art results on the Natural Questions and TriviaQA open benchmarks.  Si xiiso leh, waxaynu aragnaa in horumarinta qaababkan aad u kordhiya marka la kordhiyo tirada baasaboor la soo qaaday. Tani waa caddeynta, in tusaalaha xilliga lagu sameeyo waxay bixiyaan jidh dhaqdhaqaaqsan si aad u faa’iido ah oo ay ugu soo bandhigaan markhaatiyada baasabooyin kala duduwan.", 'ro': 'Modelele generative pentru răspunsul la întrebări pe domeniu deschis s-au dovedit a fi competitive, fără a recurge la cunoștințe externe. Deși promițătoare, această abordare necesită utilizarea de modele cu miliarde de parametri, care sunt costisitoare pentru a instrui și interoga. În această lucrare, investigăm cât de mult pot beneficia aceste modele din recuperarea pasajelor text, care conțin potențial dovezi. Obținem rezultate de ultimă oră în ceea ce privește chestiunile naturale și criteriile deschise TriviaQA. Interesant, observăm că performanța acestei metode se îmbunătățește semnificativ atunci când crește numărul de pasaje recuperate. Aceasta este o dovadă că modelele secvență-la-secvență oferă un cadru flexibil pentru agregarea eficientă și combinarea dovezilor din mai multe pasaje.', 'sr': 'Generativni modeli za odgovor na pitanje otvorenog domena dokazali su da su konkurentni, a da ne prihvate vanjsko znanje. Iako obećavam, taj pristup zahteva da koristi modele sa milijardama parametara, koji su skupi za obuku i pitanje. U ovom papiru istražujemo koliko ovih modela mogu profitirati od prikupljanja tekstskih prolaza, potencijalno sadržavanja dokaza. Dobili smo rezultate umetnosti prirodnih pitanja i otvorene kriterije TriviaQA. Zanimljivo je da primećujemo da se učinkovitost ove metode značajno poboljšava kada povećava broj prikupljenih prolaza. To je dokaz da modeli sekvence do sekvence nude fleksibilni okvir za efikasno okupljanje i kombinaciju dokaza iz višestrukih prolaza.', 'ta': 'திறந்த டொமைன் கேள்விக்கு பதில் பாதுகாப்பான மாதிரிகள் வெளி அறிவை பயன்படுத்தாமல் போராட்டியாக இருக்கும். உறுதிப்படுத்தும் போது, இந்த முறைமையில் பில்லியன் அளபுருக்களை பயன்படுத்த வேண்டும், இது பயிற்சி மற்றும் கேள்வி  இந்த காகிதத்தில், இந்த மாதிரிகள் எவ்வளவு பயன்படுத்தும் என்பதை நாம் சோதிக்க வேண்டும். உரை கடவுச்செல்களை பெறுவதற்க We obtain state-of-the-art results on the Natural Questions and TriviaQA open benchmarks.  சுவாரசியமாக, இந்த முறைமையின் செயல்பாடு மீட்டப்பட்ட கடவுச்செல்களின் எண்ணிக்கையை அதிகரிக்கும் போது முன்னேற இது தெளிவான அத்தாட்சிகளாக இருக்கும் தொடர்ச்சி மாதிரிகள் ஒரு flexible சட்டத்தை வழங்குகிறது செயல்படுத்தி பல கடவுச்செல்களில் இருந்', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැ පොරොන්දු කරනවා වගේම, මේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්නේ බිලියර් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් තියෙන මොඩේල් භාවිතා කරන්න, ඒ මේ පත්තරේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා මේ මොඩේල් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, ප්\u200dරයෝජනයෙන් ස අපි ප්\u200dරාකෘතික ප්\u200dරශ්න සහ ත්\u200dරිවියාQA අරින්න බෙන්ච්මාර්ක්ස් එකේ ස්ථානය-of-the-art ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200d විශේෂයෙන්, අපි බලන්නේ මේ විධානයේ ප්\u200dරමාණය ගොඩක් වැඩි වෙනස් වෙනවා කියලා. මේක සාක්ෂිත සාක්ෂියක් විතරයි ක්\u200dරමාණ පරීක්ෂණයෙන් සාක්ෂිත සැකසුම් කරනවා වගේම සාක්ෂිත සාක්ෂිත සංව', 'ur': 'کھلے ڈومین سوال کے جواب کے لئے پیدا کرنے والی موڈلیاں ثابت ہوگئیں، بغیر باہر علم کے ساتھ رغبت کرنے کے۔ جب وعدہ کرتا ہے، اس طریقہ کی ضرورت ہے کہ ایک میلیارد پارامتر کے ساتھ موڈل استعمال کریں، جو ٹرین اور سوال کے لئے گران ہیں. ہم اس کاغذ میں تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ یہ مدل کیسے فائدہ پہنچا سکتے ہیں، شاید مدرک کے ساتھ ہے. ہم طبیعی سوال اور TriviaQA کھلی سنچمٹ پر قابل تحقیقات کا نتیجہ حاصل کرتے ہیں. ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ اس طریقہ کی عملکرد بہت اضافہ ہوتی ہے جب اٹھائے جاتے ہیں۔ یہ شہادت ہے کہ سفارش سے سفارش کے ذریعہ مدل ایک ہلکس فرم کے لئے بہت سی مسافروں سے مدرک جمع کرنے اور ترکیب کرنے کے لئے ایک ہلکس فرم پیش کرتا ہے.', 'sv': 'Generativa modeller för open domain frågesvar har visat sig vara konkurrenskraftiga, utan att tillgripa extern kunskap. Även om det är lovande, kräver detta tillvägagångssätt att använda modeller med miljarder parametrar, som är dyra att träna och fråga. I denna uppsats undersöker vi hur mycket dessa modeller kan dra nytta av att hämta textavsnitt som potentiellt innehåller bevis. Vi får toppmoderna resultat på de öppna riktmärkena Natural Questions och TriviaQA. Intressant nog observerar vi att prestandan av denna metod förbättras avsevärt när antalet hämtade passager ökar. Detta är bevis för att sekvens-till-sekvensmodeller erbjuder ett flexibelt ramverk för att effektivt samla och kombinera bevis från flera passager.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Bu usulni ishlash uchun milliard parametrlar bilan foydalanish kerak. Bu tilni tahrirlash va soʻrov uchun qiymatdir. Bu hujjatda, bu modellar matn maxfiy soʻzni olish uchun qanchalik foydalanishini aniqlamiz, balki hozir mavjud. Biz tabiiy savollar va TriviaQA ochiq balbalar haqida davlat natijasi natijasi natijasi topamiz. Shunday qiziqarli, biz bu usulning amalni olib tashlangan maxfiy soʻzlarni ko'paytirishda juda katta yaxshi ko'ra olamiz. This is evidence that sequence-to-sequence models offers a flexible framework to efficiently aggregate and combine evidence from multiple passages.", 'vi': 'Tạo ra các mẫu cho câu hỏi mở miền đã được công bố cạnh tranh, không cần phải dùng kiến thức ngoại giao. Trong khi hứa hẹn, cách tiếp cận này cần phải sử dụng các mô hình với hàng tỉ thông số, mà rất tốn kém để huấn luyện và thẩm vấn. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi điều tra xem những mô hình này có lợi ích gì khi lấy đoạn văn bản, có khả năng có bằng chứng. Chúng tôi có kết quả hiện đại về câu hỏi tự nhiên và cuộc sống. Thật thú vị, chúng tôi thấy hiệu quả của phương pháp này cải thiện đáng kể khi tăng số đoạn được tìm thấy. Đây là bằng chứng cho thấy các mô- trình-tới-trình mô-suất cung cấp một cơ sở linh hoạt để kết hợp các bằng chứng từ nhiều đoạn.', 'bg': 'Генеративните модели за отговор на въпроси с отворен домейн се доказаха конкурентоспособни, без да прибягват до външни знания. Макар и обещаващ, този подход изисква да се използват модели с милиарди параметри, които са скъпи за обучение и запитване. В тази статия изследваме до каква степен тези модели могат да се възползват от извличането на текстови пасажи, потенциално съдържащи доказателства. Получаваме най-съвременни резултати по откритите критерии за природни въпроси и ТривиаКА. Интересното е, че наблюдаваме, че ефективността на този метод значително се подобрява при увеличаване на броя на възстановените пасажи. Това е доказателство, че моделите последователност към последователност предлагат гъвкава рамка за ефективно агрегиране и комбиниране на доказателства от множество пасажи.', 'nl': 'Generatieve modellen voor het beantwoorden van open domeinvragen zijn concurrerend gebleken, zonder gebruik te maken van externe kennis. Hoewel veelbelovend, vereist deze aanpak het gebruik van modellen met miljarden parameters, die duur zijn om te trainen en te bevragen. In dit artikel onderzoeken we hoeveel deze modellen kunnen profiteren van het terugvinden van tekstpassages die mogelijk bewijs bevatten. We verkrijgen state-of-the-art resultaten op de Natural Questions en TriviaQA open benchmarks. Interessant is dat de prestaties van deze methode aanzienlijk verbeteren bij het verhogen van het aantal opgehaalde passages. Dit is het bewijs dat sequentiemodellen een flexibel kader bieden om efficiënt bewijs uit meerdere passages te aggregeren en te combineren.', 'da': 'Generative modeller til open domain spørgsmål besvarelse har vist sig at være konkurrencedygtige uden at ty til ekstern viden. Selvom den lover, kræver denne tilgang at bruge modeller med milliarder af parametre, som er dyre at træne og forespørge. I denne artikel undersøger vi, hvor meget disse modeller kan drage fordel af at hente tekstpassager, der potentielt indeholder beviser. Vi opnår state-of-the-art resultater på naturlige spørgsmål og TriviaQA åbne benchmarks. Interessant nok bemærker vi, at ydeevnen af denne metode forbedres betydeligt, når antallet af hentede passager øges. Dette er bevis for, at sekvens-til-sekvens modeller tilbyder en fleksibel ramme til effektivt at samle og kombinere beviser fra flere passager.', 'hr': 'Generativni modeli odgovora na otvoreno pitanje domena dokazali su se da su konkurentni, a da ne približavaju vanjskom znanju. Iako obećavam, taj pristup zahtijeva koristiti modele s milijardama parametara, koji su skupi za obuku i pitanje. U ovom papiru istražujemo koliko ovih modela mogu koristiti od povratka tekstskih prolaza, potencijalno sadržavajući dokaze. Dobićemo rezultate stanja umjetnosti prirodnih pitanja i otvorene kriterije TriviaQA. Zanimljivo, primećujemo da se učinkovitost ove metode značajno poboljšava kada povećava broj prikupljenih prolaza. To je dokaz da modeli sekvence do sekvence nude fleksibilni okvir za učinkovito okupljanje i kombinaciju dokaza iz višestrukih prolaza.', 'de': 'Generative Modelle zur Beantwortung offener Fragen haben sich als wettbewerbsfähig erwiesen, ohne auf externes Wissen zurückzugreifen. Obwohl dieser Ansatz vielversprechend ist, erfordert er die Verwendung von Modellen mit Milliarden von Parametern, die teuer zu trainieren und abzufragen sind. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir, wie sehr diese Modelle von der Suche nach Textpassagen profitieren können, die möglicherweise Beweise enthalten. Wir erhalten aktuelle Ergebnisse zu den offenen Benchmarks Natural Questions und TriviaQA. Interessanterweise beobachten wir, dass sich die Leistung dieser Methode deutlich verbessert, wenn die Anzahl der abgerufenen Passagen erhöht wird. Dies ist der Beweis dafür, dass Sequenzmodelle ein flexibles Framework bieten, um Evidenz aus mehreren Passagen effizient zu aggregieren und zu kombinieren.', 'ko': '개방 분야 문답의 생성적 모델은 이미 경쟁력이 있고 외부 지식을 빌릴 필요가 없다는 것이 증명되었다.이런 방법은 장래성이 있지만 수십억 개의 파라미터를 가진 모델을 사용해야 하기 때문에 이런 파라미터의 훈련과 조회 비용이 매우 높다.본고에서 우리는 이 모델들이 증거를 포함할 수 있는 텍스트 단락을 검색하는 데 이득을 보는 정도를 연구했다.우리는 자연 문제와 TriviaQA 개방 기준에 대한 최신 결과를 얻었다.흥미로운 것은 검색 채널의 수가 증가함에 따라 이런 방법의 성능이 현저히 향상되었다는 것을 관찰했다.이것은 서열에서 서열 모델까지 유연한 구조를 제공하여 여러 단락에서 나온 증거를 효과적으로 집합하고 조합할 수 있음을 나타낸다.', 'id': 'Model generatif untuk menjawab pertanyaan domain terbuka telah terbukti kompetitif, tanpa menggunakan pengetahuan luar. Sementara menjanjikan, pendekatan ini memerlukan untuk menggunakan model dengan miliaran parameter, yang mahal untuk dilatih dan bertanya. Dalam kertas ini, kami menyelidiki seberapa banyak model ini dapat berguna dari mengambil kalimat teks, potensial mengandung bukti. Kami mendapatkan hasil terbaik pada pertanyaan alam dan benchmarks terbuka TriviaQA. Menarik, kami memperhatikan bahwa prestasi metode ini meningkat dengan signifikan ketika meningkat jumlah laluan yang dicapai. Ini adalah bukti bahwa model urutan-urutan menawarkan rangkaian fleksibel untuk secara efisien agregasi dan menggabungkan bukti dari beberapa jalur.', 'tr': 'Aç domena soragy jogaplamak üçin döredijili nusgalar daşary bilimi ýok edip, ýaryşykly bolup kanıtlandyrylýar. Şahsy söz berýän bolsa, bu ýagdaý milliardlarça parametrer bilen nusgalary ulanmaly, otlamak we soraglamak üçin wagt. Bu kagyzda, biz bu nusgalaryň metin geçirişlerini almakdan näçe fayda ýok edip biljek bolandygyny soruşýarys. Belki-de kanlag bar. Biz natural soraglary we TriviaQA açık çözümlerde resim alandyk. İlginç ki, bu yöntemin işlemleri, alınan geçişlerin sayısını arttırken önemli şekilde geliştirdiğini görüyoruz. Bu görnüş-lerleme nusgalarynyň birnäçe gezeden kanıtlary birleştirmek we üýtgetmek üçin fleksibil bir çerçewçilikdir.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای تولید برای جواب سوال دامنی باز، ثابت شده است که مسابقه\u200cای باشد، بدون اجرا به دانش خارجی. در حالی که قول می دهند، این روش نیاز به استفاده از مدل با میلیاردها پارامتر است که برای آموزش و سؤال گران است. در این کاغذ، ما تحقیق می کنیم که چقدر این مدل\u200cها می\u200cتوانند از دریافت گذشته\u200cهای متن سود ببرند، شاید شامل مدرک باشند. ما نتیجه\u200cهای وضعیت هنری در سوال طبیعی و برچسب\u200cهای باز TriviaQA را دریافت می\u200cکنیم. Interestingly, we observe that the performance of this method significantly improves when increasing the number of obtained passages. این مدرک است که مدرک\u200cهای ردیابی به ردیابی یک چهارچوب flexible را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد تا به طور موثرت مدرک\u200cهای چندین ردیابی را جمع و ترکیب کند.', 'af': "Genereerde modele vir oop domein vraag antwoord het bevestig om medelyk te wees, sonder om eksterne kennis te hê. Terwyl belofte, hierdie toegang benodig om modele te gebruik met miljarde parameters, wat koste is om te trein en navraag. In hierdie papier, ons ondersoek hoeveel hierdie modele kan voordeel van teks wagte te ontvang, potensieel bevat getuienis. Ons kry staat-van-kuns resultate op die Natuurlike Vrades en TriviaQA oop benchmarke. Interesante, ons aanhou dat die prestasie van hierdie metode betekenlik verbeter wanneer die aantal ontvangde wagte vergroot word. Hierdie is bevestig dat sekwensie-na-sekwensie-modele 'n fleksibele raamwerk aanbied om effektief te sameleer en te kombinerer bevestige van veelvuldige wagte.", 'sw': 'Generative models for open domain question answering have proven to be competitive, without resorting to external knowledge.  Wakati unavyoahidi, mbinu hii inahitaji kutumia mifano yenye mabilioni ya parameter, ambayo ni ghali ya kufundisha na kuuliza. Katika karatasi hii, tunachunguza namna gani mifano hii inaweza kunufaika na kupata upatikanaji wa maandishi, pengine ina ushahidi. Tunapata matokeo ya hali ya sanaa juu ya maswali ya asili na misingi ya wazi ya TriviaQA. Inafurahisha, tunaona kwamba utendaji wa mbinu hii unaongezeka kwa kiasi kikubwa pale ambapo kuongeza idadi ya njia zilizopata. Hii ni ushahidi kwamba mifano ya mfululizo kwa mfululizo unatoa mfumo mzuri wa kuzuia ufanisi na kuunganisha ushahidi kutoka kwa njia mbalimbali.', 'sq': 'Modelet gjenerative për përgjigjen e pyetjeve të hapura në domeni kanë provuar të jenë konkurruese, pa përdorur njohuri të jashtme. Ndërsa premton, kjo qasje kërkon përdorimin e modeleve me miliarda parametra, të cilat janë të shtrenjta për trajnimin dhe kërkimin. Në këtë letër, ne hetojmë sa mund të përfitojnë këto modele nga marrja e pasazheve teksti, që mund të përmbajnë prova. Ne arrijmë rezultate të moderna në çështjet natyrore dhe nivelet e hapura të TriviaQA. Interesante, ne vëzhgojmë se performanca e këtij metode përmirësohet ndjeshëm kur rritet numri i pasazheve të marrë. Kjo është provë se modelet sekuencë-sekuencë ofrojnë një kuadër fleksibel për të agreguar dhe kombinuar efektivisht provat nga pasazhe të shumta.', 'hy': 'Հարցը բաց տիեզերքում պատասխանելու ստեղծագործական մոդելները պարզվել են մրցակցություն, առանց օգտագործելու արտաքին գիտելիքը: Երբ խոստացնող է, այս մոտեցումը պահանջում է օգտագործել միլիարդավոր պարամետրերի մոդելներ, որոնք թանկ են ուսուցման և հարցումների համար: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե ինչքանով են այս մոդելները օգտակար տեքստի հատվածների վերաբերյալ, որոնք պոտենցիալ պարունակում են ապացույցներ: Մենք ստանում ենք նորագույն արդյունքներ բնական հարցերի և Թրիվիայի հարցերի վրա: Interestingly, we observe that the performance of this method significantly improves when increasing the number of retrieved passages.  Սա ապացույց է տալիս, որ հաջորդականություն առ հաջորդականություն մոդելները հնարավորություն են տալիս ճկուն շրջանակ, որպեսզի արդյունավետ համախմբեն և համախմբեն բազմաթիվ հաջորդականությունների ապացույցները:', 'bn': 'উন্মুক্ত ডোমেইন প্রশ্নের উত্তরের জন্য প্রজন্ম মডেল প্রমাণ করেছে যে বাইরের জ্ঞান ব্যবহার করা ছাড়া প্রতিযোগিতার প্রত প্রতিশ্রুতি দিচ্ছিলেও, এই পদ্ধতি মোডেল ব্যবহার করার প্রয়োজন বিলিয়ন প্যারামিটার দিয়ে, যা প্রশিক্ষণ ও অনুসন্ধানের জন্ In this paper, we investigate how much these models can benefit from retrieving text passages, potentially containing evidence.  আমরা প্রাকৃতিক প্রশ্ন এবং ত্রিভিয়াকুয়ার প্রশ্নের উপর রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের ফলাফল পেয়েছি। মজার ব্যাপারে আমরা দেখছি যে এই পদ্ধতির প্রভাব বেড়ে যাওয়ার সময় পাসগুলোর সংখ্যা বৃদ্ধি পায়। এটা প্রমাণ যে সেকেন্স-থেকে সেক্সিকেন্স মডেল কার্যক্রমে কার্যকর করে কার্যকর করে প্রমাণ করে এবং বেশ কয়েকটি পাসগুলো থেকে প্রমাণ স', 'ca': "Els models generadors per respondre a preguntes de domini obert han demostrat ser competitius, sense recorrer al coneixement extern. Mentre prometedor, aquest enfocament necessita utilitzar models amb milers de milions de paràmetres, que són costosos per entrenar i consultar. En aquest article investigam quants poden beneficiar aquests models de recuperar passatges de text, potencialment contenint evidències. Obtenim resultats més avançats en les preguntes naturals i els punts de referència oberts de TriviaQA. Interessant, observem que el rendiment d'aquest mètode millora significativament quan augmenta el nombre de passatges recuperats. Aquesta és l'evidència que els models de seqüència a seqüència ofereixen un marc flexible per agregar i combinar eficientment les evidències de múltiples passatges.", 'am': 'የውጭው እውቀት ሳይጠይቅ የዶሜን ጠያቄ መልስ ተቃዋሚ ሞዴል ሆኗል፡፡ በተስፋ ቃል፣ ይህ ሥርዓት በቢልዮን ሚሊዮን ሚተራሮችን ለማስተማርና ለመጠየቅ የከበረ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ እነዚህ ምሳሌዎች የጽሑፍ መግቢያ መግለጫ እንዴት እንደሚጠቅሙ እናምርመራለን፡፡ የአካባቢ ጥያቄዎች እና ቱርቪያ ክፍሎች ላይ የሀገር አርእስት ውጤቶች አግኝተናል፡፡ በአደጋጋጋሚ፣ የዚህ ሥርዓት ፈቃድ ቁጥር በሚያበዛ ጊዜ የሥልጣን ሥርዓት እንዲያበዛ እናየዋለን፡፡ ይህ ማስረጃ ነው፣ የግንኙነት እና የግንኙነት ዓይነቶች በአካባቢ መንገድ ማስረጃዎችን ለመግለጥ እና ማስረጃዎችን ለመቀላቀል የሚችል ነው፡፡', 'cs': 'Generační modely pro odpovědi na otázky otevřené domény se ukázaly jako konkurenceschopné, aniž by se uchýlily k externím znalostem. I když tento přístup slibný, vyžaduje použití modelů s miliardami parametrů, které jsou drahé na trénování a dotazování. V tomto článku zkoumáme, jak moc tyto modely mohou mít prospěch z hledání textových pasáží, potenciálně obsahujících důkazy. Získáváme nejmodernější výsledky týkající se přírodních otázek a otevřených referenčních měřítek TriviaQA. Zajímavé je, že výkon této metody se výrazně zlepšuje při zvýšení počtu získaných pasáží. To je důkaz, že modely sekvence k sekvenci nabízejí flexibilní rámec pro efektivní agregování a kombinování důkazů z více pasáží.', 'az': 'Açıq domena suallarının cavab verməsi üçün tədbir modelləri, dış bilgisinə istifadə etmədən müqayisədə olduğuna bəyan edilmişdir. Bu tərzim milyard parametru ilə modelləri istifadə etmək lazımdır, bu tərzim təhsil etmək və soruşmaq üçün mal. Bu kağızda, bu modellərin mətn keçişlərini almaqdan nə qədər fayda verə biləcəyini təsdiqləyirik, potensial dəlilləri içərik. Biz Təbiətli suallar və TriviaQA açıq benchmarklar üzərində sanat sonuçlarını alırıq. İlginç olaraq, biz bu metodun işlətməsi çox yaxşılaşdığını görürük. Bu, sequence-to-sequence modellərin çoxlu yollardan dəlilləri birləşdirmək üçün fleksib bir frameworkdir.', 'bs': 'Generativni modeli za odgovor na pitanje otvorenog domena dokazali su da su konkurentni, a da se ne približavaju vanjskim znanjima. Iako obećavam, taj pristup zahtijeva koristiti modele sa milijardama parametara, koji su skupi za obuku i pitanje. U ovom papiru istražujemo koliko ovih modela mogu koristiti od povratka tekstskih prolaza, potencijalno sadržavajući dokaze. Dobili smo rezultate umjetnosti prirodnih pitanja i otvorene kriterije TriviaQA. Zanimljivo, primećujemo da se učinkovitost ove metode značajno poboljšava kada povećava broj prikupljenih prolaza. To je dokaz da modeli sekvence do sekvence nude fleksibilni okvir za efikasno okupljanje i kombinaciju dokaza iz višestrukih prolaza.', 'et': 'Avatud domeeni küsimustele vastamise generatiivsed mudelid on osutunud konkurentsivõimeliseks, kasutamata välisteadmisi. Kuigi see lähenemisviis on paljulubav, nõuab see miljardite parameetritega mudelite kasutamist, mida on kulukas koolitada ja pärida. Käesolevas töös uurime, kui palju need mudelid saavad kasu tõendeid sisaldavate tekstilõikude leidmisest. Saame kaasaegseid tulemusi loodusküsimuste ja TriviaQA avatud võrdluskriteeriumide kohta. Huvitavalt täheldame, et selle meetodi jõudlus paraneb märkimisväärselt, kui suurendatakse väljavõetud lõikude arvu. See on tõendusmaterjal, et jada-jada mudelid pakuvad paindlikku raamistikku, et tõhusalt koondada ja kombineerida tõendeid mitmest lõigust.', 'fi': 'Generatiiviset mallit avoimeen verkkotunnukseen vastaamiseen ovat osoittautuneet kilpailukykyisiksi ilman ulkopuolista tietoa. Vaikka tämä lähestymistapa on lupaava, se edellyttää miljardeja parametreja sisältävien mallien käyttöä, joita on kallista kouluttaa ja kysellä. Tässä artikkelissa selvitämme, kuinka paljon nämä mallit voivat hyötyä tekstikohtien hakemisesta, jotka mahdollisesti sisältävät todisteita. Saamme uusimmat tulokset Natural Questions- ja TriviaQA-avoimista vertailuarvoista. Mielenkiintoista on huomata, että tämän menetelmän suorituskyky paranee merkittävästi, kun haettujen kohtien määrää lisätään. Tämä on todiste siitä, että sekvenssimallit tarjoavat joustavan kehyksen koota ja yhdistää tehokkaasti näyttöä useista vaiheista.', 'ha': "Imoyi mai ƙidãya wa mai karɓa wa tambayar Domen da aka buɗe, sun jarraba su yi daɗayi, kuma ba su yi amfani da ilmi baka ba. Waku da ake yi musu wa'adi, wannan hanyor ya kamata a yi amfani da misãlai masu da billionn parameteri, da masu kyauta ne ga yin kõri da yin tambayi. Ga wannan takardan, Munã tambaya cewa misalin waɗannan ana iya amfani da su daga samun za'a iya samun hanya na matsayi, mai yiwuwa ana ƙunsa da shaidar. QA Ina mai amfani, Munã ganin cewa cikakken wannan metode yana ƙaranci mai girma idan an ƙara ƙidãyar hanya da aka samu. Wannan wata shaida ne da misãlai masu sakan-zuwa-sequence ke bãyar da firam mai fleksibo dõmin ya haɗa bayani masu Eficient kuma ya sami shaidar daga wasu tafarki.", 'sk': 'Generativni modeli za odprto domeno odgovarjanje na vprašanja so se izkazali za konkurenčni, ne da bi se zatekali k zunanjemu znanju. Čeprav je ta pristop obetaven, zahteva uporabo modelov z milijardami parametrov, ki jih je drago trenirati in poizvedati. V prispevku raziskujemo, koliko lahko ti modeli koristijo od iskanja besedilnih odlomkov, ki bi lahko vsebovali dokaze. Pridobimo najsodobnejše rezultate na odprtih merilih naravnih vprašanj in TriviaQA. Zanimivo je, da se učinkovitost te metode bistveno izboljša pri povečanju števila pridobljenih prehodov. To je dokaz, da modeli iz zaporedja do zaporedja ponujajo prilagodljiv okvir za učinkovito združevanje in združevanje dokazov iz več prehodov.', 'jv': 'Generative modes for open domain question politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Nang mapukan iki, kita ujaran sakjane perusahaan model iki bakal nggawe kelalahku kelalahku kelalahku nggawe barang seneng pisan. Awak dhéwé iso nggoleki state-of-the-arts banjuré ning aturan Russisan karo TribiaqA bukun bench. Ngerti kanggo ngerasah dumadhi iki banget kanggo ngerasah seneng pisan pangan Iki buk ngobudhakan karo model sing sekèn-to-sekèn kuwi tindakan sistem sing beraksi kanggo ngregani soko ngono ngregani aturan sing suku atik dadi pasang.', 'he': 'מודלים יצירתיים לענות על שאלות בתחום פתוח הוכיחו להיות תחרותיים, בלי להשתמש בידע חיצוני. בעוד מבטיח, גישה זו דורשת להשתמש בדוגמנים עם מיליארדי פרמטרים, אשר יקרים לאימון ולבקש. בעיתון הזה, אנו חוקרים עד כמה הדוגמנים האלה יכולים להשיג מעברים טקסטים, שאולי מכילים ראיות. We obtain state-of-the-art results on the Natural Questions and TriviaQA open benchmarks.  מעניין, אנו רואים שהביצועים של השיטה הזאת משתפרים באופן משמעותי כשמגבירים את מספר המעברים שנמצאים. זוהי ראיה כי דוגמנים רצף-לרצף מציעים מסגרת גמישה כדי לארגן וביעילות את הראיות ממעברים רבים.', 'bo': 'Generative models for open domain question answering have proven to be competitive, without resorting to external knowledge. While promising, this approach requires to use models with billions of parameters, which are expensive to train and query. ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་མིག་ཆས་འདི་དག་གི་དོན་ཚན ང་ཚོས་རང་རྒྱུས་ཀྱི་དྲི་ཚིག་དང་། TriviaQA ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་དཔོན་རིམ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་རེད། འཛམ་གླིང་སྤྱིར་བཏང་ན། འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཐབས་ལམ་འདིའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་ཀྱི་ཨང་ཀི་དར་བསྐྱེད་དུས་སྐབས་ཡོད་ཚད་ལ་འགྱུར་བའ འདི་ནི་sequence-to-sequence models་གིས་ཡུལ་གྱིས་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་པ་ཞིག་གིས་ປະສུན་ཡོད་པའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཡིག་ཆ་སྣ་ཚོགས་ལས'}
{'en': 'A Neural Few-Shot Text Classification Reality Check', 'pt': 'Uma verificação da realidade de classificação de texto neural de poucos tiros', 'es': 'Una verificación de la realidad de la clasificación de texto neuronal de pocos disparos', 'ar': 'فحص واقع تصنيف النص العصبي قليل اللقطات', 'fr': 'Une vérification de la réalité de classification de texte neuronal en quelques coups', 'ja': 'ニューラル・フィーショット・テキスト・クラシフィケーション・リアリティ・チェック', 'zh': '神经性少镜头文本分类见实', 'hi': 'एक तंत्रिका कुछ शॉट पाठ वर्गीकरण वास्तविकता की जाँच करें', 'ru': 'Проверка реальности нейронных текстовых классификаций с помощью нескольких снимков', 'ga': 'Seiceáil Réaltacht Aicmithe Téacs Cúpla Néarach', 'hu': 'A neurális néhány felvételű szöveg osztályozása Valóság ellenőrzés', 'el': 'Ένας Νευρικός έλεγχος πραγματικότητας ταξινόμησης κειμένου ελάχιστων πυροβολισμών', 'it': 'Un controllo di realtà della classificazione del testo neurale di pochi scatti', 'kk': 'Нейралық кем- кем мәтін классификациясының шындығын тексеру', 'lt': 'A Neural Few-Shot Text Classification Reality Check', 'ka': 'Name', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'A Neural Few-Shot Text Classification Reality Check', 'ml': 'ഒരു നെയുറല്\u200d ചെറിയ ഷോട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്ന പദാവലി ക്ലാസിഷനേഷന്\u200d റിയൂറല്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുക', 'no': 'Name', 'mt': 'Verifika tar-realtà tal-Klassifikazzjoni tat-Test Newrali b’Ħafna Riżultati', 'mn': 'Шинэ цөөн хэмжээний текст классификацийн бодит шалгалт', 'ro': 'Verificarea realității clasificării textului neural cu câteva fotografii', 'pl': 'A Neural Few-Shot Tekst Klasyfikacja Rzeczywistości Test', 'sr': 'Neuralno malo snimanje teksta klasifikacije realnosti', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Ka hubsada xaqiiqada fasaxa ee qoraalka qoyska ee Neural-Shot', 'sv': 'En Neural Few-Shot Text Klassificering Verklighetskontroll', 'ta': 'A Neural Few-Shot Text Classification Reality Check', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Trình kiểm tra thực tế về các thần kinh', 'bg': 'Проверка на реалността за класификация на неврален текст', 'da': 'En Neural Few-Shot Tekst Klassificering Reality Check', 'nl': 'Een Neural Few-Shot Tekst Classificatie Reality Check', 'ko': '신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 다중 렌즈 텍스트 분류 방법', 'de': 'Ein neuraler Test der Textklassifikation mit wenigen Aufnahmen', 'hr': 'Provjera stvarnosti klasifikacije teksta u neurološkom malom snimanju', 'tr': 'Täze bir sened beýik gijesi', 'id': 'Sebuah pemeriksaan Realitas Klasifikasi Teks Beberapa Tembakan Neural', 'sq': 'Kontrollo realitetin e klasifikimit të tekstit me pak gjuajtje nervore', 'af': 'Name', 'fa': 'Name', 'am': 'የአሁኑን ፋይል አስቀምጥ', 'sw': 'Check Reality for Classification Text', 'az': 'NĂ¶ral KĂ¼Ă§Ă¼k MÉ™tn Klasifikasyonu Verici', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Provjera stvarnosti klasifikacije teksta u neurološkom malom snimanju', 'hy': 'Comment', 'fi': 'Neuraalinen muutaman kuvan tekstin luokitus Reality Check', 'ca': 'Una verificació de la realitat de la classificació de text neuronal', 'cs': 'A Neural Few-Shot Text Classification Reality Check', 'et': 'Neuraalse mõne pildi teksti klassifitseerimise reaalsuse kontroll', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'sk': 'Preverjanje realnosti razvrstitve besedila z nekaj posnetki', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Name', 'bo': 'Neural Few-Shot Text Classification Reality Check'}
{'en': 'Modern classification models tend to struggle when the amount of annotated data is scarce. To overcome this issue, several neural few-shot classification models have emerged, yielding significant progress over time, both in Computer Vision and Natural Language Processing. In the latter, such models used to rely on fixed word embeddings, before the advent of transformers. Additionally, some models used in Computer Vision are yet to be tested in NLP applications. In this paper, we compare all these models, first adapting those made in the field of image processing to NLP, and second providing them access to transformers. We then test these models equipped with the same transformer-based encoder on the intent detection task, known for having a large amount of classes. Our results reveal that while methods perform almost equally on the ARSC dataset, this is not the case for the Intent Detection task, where most recent and supposedly best competitors perform worse than older and simpler ones (while all are are given access to transformers). We also show that a simple baseline is surprisingly strong. All the new developed models as well as the evaluation framework are made publicly available.', 'ar': 'تميل نماذج التصنيف الحديثة إلى النضال عندما تكون كمية البيانات المشروحة نادرة. للتغلب على هذه المشكلة ، ظهرت عدة نماذج تصنيف عصبية قليلة اللقطات ، مما أسفر عن تقدم كبير بمرور الوقت ، في كل من رؤية الكمبيوتر ومعالجة اللغة الطبيعية. في الأخير ، كانت مثل هذه النماذج تستخدم للاعتماد على الزخارف الثابتة ، قبل ظهور المحولات. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، فإن بعض النماذج المستخدمة في Computer Vision لم يتم اختبارها بعد في تطبيقات البرمجة اللغوية العصبية (NLP). في هذا البحث ، نقارن كل هذه النماذج ، أولاً نتكيف مع تلك المصنوعة في مجال معالجة الصور مع البرمجة اللغوية العصبية ، وثانيًا نوفر لهم الوصول إلى المحولات. ثم نختبر هذه النماذج المجهزة بنفس المشفر المستند إلى المحول في مهمة الكشف عن النية ، والمعروف بوجود عدد كبير من الفئات. تكشف نتائجنا أنه بينما تعمل الأساليب بشكل متساوٍ تقريبًا على مجموعة بيانات ARSC ، فإن هذا ليس هو الحال بالنسبة لمهمة اكتشاف النية ، حيث يكون أداء المنافسين الأحدث والأفضل من حيث الأداء أسوأ من المنافسين الأقدم والأبسط (بينما يتم منحهم جميعًا إمكانية الوصول إلى المحولات). نظهر أيضًا أن خط الأساس البسيط قوي بشكل مدهش. جميع النماذج المطورة الجديدة وكذلك إطار التقييم متاحة للجمهور.', 'pt': 'Os modelos de classificação modernos tendem a ter dificuldades quando a quantidade de dados anotados é escassa. Para superar esse problema, surgiram vários modelos neurais de classificação de poucos tiros, gerando progressos significativos ao longo do tempo, tanto em Visão Computacional quanto em Processamento de Linguagem Natural. Neste último, tais modelos costumavam contar com embeddings fixos de palavras, antes do advento dos transformadores. Além disso, alguns modelos usados em Visão Computacional ainda não foram testados em aplicações de PNL. Neste artigo, comparamos todos esses modelos, primeiro adaptando aqueles feitos na área de processamento de imagens para a PNL e, segundo, fornecendo-lhes acesso a transformadores. Em seguida, testamos esses modelos equipados com o mesmo codificador baseado em transformador na tarefa de detecção de intenção, conhecido por ter uma grande quantidade de classes. Nossos resultados revelam que, embora os métodos tenham um desempenho quase igual no conjunto de dados ARSC, esse não é o caso da tarefa de detecção de intenção, onde os concorrentes mais recentes e supostamente melhores têm desempenho pior do que os mais antigos e mais simples (enquanto todos têm acesso a transformadores). Também mostramos que uma linha de base simples é surpreendentemente forte. Todos os novos modelos desenvolvidos, bem como a estrutura de avaliação, são disponibilizados ao público.', 'fr': "Les modèles de classification modernes ont tendance à éprouver des difficultés lorsque la quantité de données annotées est rare. Pour surmonter ce problème, plusieurs modèles de classification neuronale par injection ont vu le jour, ce qui a permis des progrès significatifs au fil du temps, à la fois en vision par ordinateur et en traitement du langage naturel. Dans ce dernier cas, ces modèles reposaient sur des intégrations de mots fixes, avant l'avènement des transformateurs. De plus, certains modèles utilisés en vision par ordinateur n'ont pas encore été testés dans les applications de PNL. Dans cet article, nous comparons tous ces modèles, en adaptant d'abord ceux réalisés dans le domaine du traitement d'image à la PNL, puis en leur donnant accès à des transformateurs. Nous testons ensuite ces modèles équipés du même encodeur basé sur transformateur sur la tâche de détection d'intention, connue pour avoir un grand nombre de classes. Nos résultats révèlent que même si les méthodes fonctionnent presque également sur l'ensemble de données ARSC, ce n'est pas le cas pour la tâche de détection d'intention, où les concurrents les plus récents et supposés les meilleurs sont moins performants que les plus anciens et les plus simples (alors que tous ont accès à des transformateurs). Nous montrons également qu'une base de référence simple est étonnamment solide. Tous les nouveaux modèles développés ainsi que le cadre d'évaluation sont mis à la disposition du public.", 'es': 'Los modelos de clasificación modernos tienden a tener problemas cuando la cantidad de datos anotados es escasa. Para superar este problema, han surgido varios modelos neuronales de clasificación de pocos disparos, que han dado lugar a avances significativos a lo largo del tiempo, tanto en la visión artificial como en el procesamiento del lenguaje natural. En este último, estos modelos solían basarse en incrustaciones de palabras fijas, antes de la llegada de los transformadores. Además, algunos modelos utilizados en Computer Vision aún no se han probado en aplicaciones de PNL. En este artículo, comparamos todos estos modelos, primero adaptando los realizados en el campo del procesamiento de imágenes a la PNL, y segundo proporcionándoles acceso a los transformadores. Luego probamos estos modelos equipados con el mismo codificador basado en transformadores en la tarea de detección de intenciones, conocida por tener una gran cantidad de clases. Nuestros resultados revelan que, si bien los métodos funcionan casi por igual en el conjunto de datos ARSC, este no es el caso de la tarea de detección de intención, en la que los competidores más recientes y supuestamente los mejores tienen un rendimiento peor que los más antiguos y simples (mientras que a todos se les da acceso a los transformadores). También demostramos que una línea de base simple es sorprendentemente sólida. Todos los nuevos modelos desarrollados, así como el marco de evaluación, se ponen a disposición del público.', 'ja': '現代の分類モデルは、注釈付きデータの量が不足している場合に苦労する傾向がある。 この問題を克服するために、いくつかのニューラル・リショット分類モデルが登場し、コンピュータビジョンと自然言語処理の両方で時間の経過とともに大きな進歩をもたらしている。 後者では、このようなモデルは変圧器の登場以前にも、固定された単語の埋め込みに依存していた。 さらに、コンピュータビジョンで使用される一部のモデルは、NLPアプリケーションでまだテストされていません。 本稿では、これらすべてのモデルを比較し、まず画像処理分野で作られたモデルをNLPに適応させ、次に変圧器へのアクセスを提供する。 次に、クラスが多いことで知られるインテント検出タスクで、同じ変圧器ベースのエンコーダを搭載したモデルをテストします。 私たちの結果は、メソッドがARSCデータセットでほぼ同じように機能する一方で、インテント検出タスクではそうではないことを明らかにしています。ここでは、ほとんどの最新の、そしておそらく最良の競合他社は、古くて単純なものよりも悪いパフォーマンスを発揮します（一方で、すべての競合他社は変圧器へのアクセスが許可されています）。 単純なベースラインは驚くほど強いことも示しています 開発されたすべての新しいモデルと評価フレームワークは公開されています。', 'zh': '当带注数据量稀缺时,今世分类往往有难。 克此数神经少镜头,随时推移,计算机视自然语言重大进展。 在后者,先变压器见,尝依定词嵌之。 此外计算机视中所用,未试于NLP应用程序也。 凡诸模形,先以图像处理域施于NLP,然后访以变压器。 然后试诸变压器之编码器,以类闻。 臣等考结果表明,虽在ARSC数集上殆同,然于意检之任不然,于意检之中,多最新以为至竞争对手较旧易竞争对手更差(而一切竞争对手皆可访变压器)。 吾犹明之,简基线可惊之强也。 凡新开模形及评估框架皆已公明。', 'hi': 'आधुनिक वर्गीकरण मॉडल तब संघर्ष करते हैं जब एनोटेटेड डेटा की मात्रा दुर्लभ होती है। इस मुद्दे को दूर करने के लिए, कई तंत्रिका कुछ-शॉट वर्गीकरण मॉडल उभरे हैं, जो समय के साथ महत्वपूर्ण प्रगति करते हैं, दोनों कंप्यूटर विजन और प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण में। उत्तरार्द्ध में, ऐसे मॉडल ट्रांसफॉर्मर के आगमन से पहले निश्चित शब्द एम्बेडिंग पर भरोसा करते थे। इसके अतिरिक्त, कंप्यूटर विजन में उपयोग किए जाने वाले कुछ मॉडलों का अभी तक एनएलपी अनुप्रयोगों में परीक्षण किया जाना बाकी है। इस पेपर में, हम इन सभी मॉडलों की तुलना करते हैं, पहले एनएलपी के लिए छवि प्रसंस्करण के क्षेत्र में किए गए लोगों को अनुकूलित करते हैं, और दूसरा उन्हें ट्रांसफार्मर तक पहुंच प्रदान करते हैं। फिर हम इन मॉडलों का परीक्षण करते हैं जो इरादे का पता लगाने के कार्य पर एक ही ट्रांसफार्मर-आधारित एन्कोडर से सुसज्जित हैं, जो बड़ी मात्रा में कक्षाओं के लिए जाना जाता है। हमारे परिणामों से पता चलता है कि जबकि विधियां एआरएससी डेटासेट पर लगभग समान रूप से प्रदर्शन करती हैं, यह इंटेंट डिटेक्शन कार्य के लिए मामला नहीं है, जहां सबसे हाल ही में और माना जाता है कि सबसे अच्छे प्रतियोगी पुराने और सरल लोगों की तुलना में बदतर प्रदर्शन करते हैं (जबकि सभी को ट्रांसफॉर्मर तक पहुंच दी जाती है)। हम यह भी दिखाते हैं कि एक साधारण आधार रेखा आश्चर्यजनक रूप से मजबूत है। सभी नए विकसित मॉडलों के साथ-साथ मूल्यांकन ढांचे को सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध कराया जाता है।', 'ru': 'Современные классификационные модели, как правило, сталкиваются с трудностями в тех случаях, когда объем аннотированных данных является недостаточным. Чтобы преодолеть эту проблему, появилось несколько нейронных моделей классификации с несколькими выстрелами, дающих значительный прогресс с течением времени, как в компьютерном зрении, так и в обработке естественного языка. В последнем случае такие модели опирались на фиксированные вложения слов, до появления трансформаторов. Кроме того, некоторые модели, используемые в Computer Vision, еще предстоит протестировать в приложениях NLP. В данной работе мы сравниваем все эти модели, во-первых, адаптируя те, которые сделаны в области обработки изображений к NLP, а во-вторых, предоставляя им доступ к трансформаторам. Затем мы тестируем эти модели, оснащенные одним и тем же кодирующим устройством на основе трансформатора, на задаче обнаружения намерений, известной наличием большого количества классов. Наши результаты показывают, что в то время как методы работают почти одинаково на наборе данных ARSC, это не относится к задаче Intent Detection, где самые последние и предположительно лучшие конкуренты работают хуже, чем старые и более простые (в то время как всем предоставляется доступ к трансформаторам). Мы также показываем, что простая базовая линия удивительно сильна. Все новые разработанные модели, а также рамки оценки предаются гласности.', 'ga': 'Tá claonadh ag samhlacha aicmithe nua-aimseartha a bheith ag streachailt nuair a bhíonn méid na sonraí anótáilte gann. Chun an tsaincheist seo a shárú, tá roinnt samhlacha néaracha aicmithe cúpla urchar tagtha chun cinn, rud a thugann dul chun cinn suntasach le himeacht ama, i bhFís Ríomhaireachta agus i bPróiseáil Teanga Nádúrtha. Sa dara ceann, úsáidtear samhlacha den sórt sin a bheith ag brath ar leabú focal seasta, roimh theacht na gclaochladáin. Ina theannta sin, tá roinnt samhlacha a úsáidtear i Computer Vision fós le tástáil in iarratais NLP. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid comparáid idir na samhlacha seo go léir, ag cur in oiriúint ar dtús iad siúd a dhéantar i réimse na próiseála íomhá go NLP, agus sa dara háit ag soláthar rochtain dóibh ar chlaochladáin. Déanaimid tástáil ansin ar na samhlacha seo atá feistithe leis an ionchódóir claochladán-bhunaithe céanna ar an tasc braite intinne, ar a dtugtar go bhfuil líon mór ranganna ann. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí, cé go bhfeidhmíonn modhanna beagnach cothrom ar thacar sonraí ARSC, ní hé seo an cás don tasc Braite Intinn, áit a n-éiríonn leis na hiomaitheoirí is déanaí agus is fearr a cheaptar a bheith níos measa ná na cinn níos sine agus níos simplí (cé go dtugtar rochtain ar chlaochladáin dóibh go léir). Léiríonn muid freisin go bhfuil bonnlíne simplí ionadh láidir. Cuirtear na samhlacha nua forbartha go léir chomh maith leis an gcreat meastóireachta ar fáil go poiblí.', 'ka': 'მოდინარე კლასიფიკაციის მოდელები უფრო ცოტა, როდესაც მონიტურებული მონაცემების რაოდენობა არაა. რამდენიმე ნეიროლური პატარა კლასიფიკაციის მოდელები მოხდა, რომლებიც დროს გადავიწყებენ მნიშვნელოვანი პროგრესი, რომლებიც კომპიუტერის ხედავად და ნაირადი ენის პროც შემდეგ, ასეთი მოდელები გამოყენებულია ტრანფორმაციის მოსახლეობისთვის, რომლებიც განსახლეობის წინ განსახლეობით. დამატებით, კომპიუტერის ხელსაწყოთან გამოყენებული მოდელები NLP პროგრამებში არაა ტესტირება. ამ დოკუნში, ჩვენ ყველა ეს მოდელების შედგომარებით, პირველად გამოსახულების გამოსახულების პანელში გამოსახულების გამოსახულების გამოსახულების გამოსახულების გამოსახულების გამო შემდეგ ჩვენ შევცვალობთ ეს მოდელები, რომლებიც იგივე ტრანფორმების ფორმებით იგივე რენფორმების ფორმებით იგივე რექსპორმების კოდირებით, რომლებიც უნდა ჩვენი წარმოდგენები აღმოჩნენ, რომ ARSC მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის შესახებ, ეს არ არის ინტენტინტური განახლების რაოდენობის შესახებ, სადაც ყველაზე ახლა და უკეთესი კონფიგურაციები უკეთესი და უკეთესი ჩვენ ასევე გამოჩვენებთ, რომ საშუალოდ მუშაობელია. ყველა ახალი განვითარებული მოდელები და განსაზღვრებული კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაცია უფლებად გახსნა.', 'hu': 'A modern osztályozási modellek hajlamosak küzdeni, ha a jegyzetelt adatok mennyisége kevés. A probléma leküzdése érdekében számos neurális néhány lövéses osztályozási modell jelent meg, ami jelentős előrelépést eredményezett az idő múlásával, mind a számítógépes látás, mind a természetes nyelv feldolgozása terén. Az utóbbiban az ilyen modellek rögzített szóbeágyazásokra támaszkodtak a transzformátorok megjelenése előtt. Ezenkívül néhány, a Computer Vision alkalmazásban használt modellt még nem tesztelték NLP alkalmazásokban. Ebben a tanulmányban összehasonlítjuk ezeket a modelleket, először a képfeldolgozás területén készült modelleket az NLP-hez igazítjuk, másodszor pedig transzformátorokhoz való hozzáférést biztosítunk. Ezután teszteljük ezeket a modelleket, amelyek ugyanazzal a transzformátor alapú útmérővel vannak felszerelve, a szándék-érzékelési feladatra ismert, nagy mennyiségű osztállyal rendelkeznek. Eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy miközben a módszerek majdnem egyformán teljesítenek az ARSC adatkészleten, ez nem igaz az Intent Detection feladatra, ahol a legújabb és állítólag legjobb versenytársak rosszabbak, mint a régebbiek és egyszerűbbek (miközben mindegyiknek hozzáférése van transzformátorokhoz). Azt is megmutatjuk, hogy egy egyszerű alap meglepően erős. Az összes új kifejlesztett modellt és az értékelési keretet nyilvánosan hozzáférhetővé teszik.', 'lt': 'Šiuolaikiniai klasifikavimo modeliai dažnai kenčia, kai yra nedaug užrašytų duomenų. Siekiant išspręsti šį klausimą, atsirado keletas nervinių nedidelių klasifikavimo modelių, kurie laikui bėgant sukėlė didelę pažangą ir kompiuterinės vizijos, ir gamtinės kalbos apdorojimo srityje. Pastaruoju atveju tokie modeliai, prieš atsirandant transformatoriams, buvo naudojami tvirtinant fiksuotus žodžius. Be to, kai kurie kompiuterio vizijoje naudojami modeliai dar turi būti išbandyti NLP programose. In this paper, we compare all these models, first adapting those made in the field of image processing to NLP, and second providing them access to transformers.  Tada bandome šiuos modelius su tuo pačiu transformatoriumi pagrįstu kodatoriumi, atliekančiu ketinimų nustatymo užduotį, žinomą turint daug klasių. Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad nors metodai veikia beveik vienodai ARSC duomenų rinkinyje, taip nėra ketinimų nustatymo užduoties atveju, kai naujausi ir tariamai geriausi konkurentai veikia blogiau nei vyresni ir paprastesni (tuo tarpu visiems suteikiama galimybė naudotis transformatoriais). Mes taip pat rodome, kad paprasta bazė yra nuostabiai stipri. Visi nauji modeliai ir vertinimo sistema skelbiami viešai.', 'it': "I moderni modelli di classificazione tendono a lottare quando la quantità di dati annotati è scarsa. Per superare questo problema, sono emersi diversi modelli di classificazione neurale a pochi scatti, che hanno portato a progressi significativi nel tempo, sia nella Computer Vision che nell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. In quest'ultimo, tali modelli si basavano su incorporazioni di parole fisse, prima dell'avvento dei trasformatori. Inoltre, alcuni modelli utilizzati in Computer Vision devono ancora essere testati nelle applicazioni NLP. In questo articolo, confrontiamo tutti questi modelli, adattando in primo luogo quelli realizzati nel campo dell'elaborazione delle immagini a NLP, e in secondo luogo fornendo loro l'accesso ai trasformatori. Testiamo quindi questi modelli dotati dello stesso encoder basato su trasformatori sul compito di rilevamento degli intenti, noto per avere una grande quantità di classi. I nostri risultati rivelano che mentre i metodi funzionano quasi allo stesso modo sul dataset ARSC, questo non è il caso del compito Intent Detection, dove i concorrenti più recenti e presumibilmente migliori hanno prestazioni peggiori di quelli più vecchi e più semplici (mentre tutti hanno accesso ai trasformatori). Mostriamo anche che una linea di base semplice è sorprendentemente forte. Tutti i nuovi modelli sviluppati e il quadro di valutazione sono resi pubblici.", 'kk': 'Қазіргі классификациялау үлгілері жазылған деректердің саны жеткілікті болғанда күреседі. Бұл мәселеді көтеру үшін бірнеше невралдық түрлі классификациялау үлгілері пайда болды. Кейбір уақыт бойынша, компьютердің көрінісі мен натуралдық тіл процессінде де де маңызды жағ Соңғы үлгілерде, түрлендірушілердің алдында, бұл үлгілерді тұрақты сөздерді ендіру үшін қолданылады. Қосымша, компьютер көрінісінде қолданылған кейбір үлгілер NLP қолданбаларында тексерілмейді. Бұл қағазда, біріншіден кескінді өңдеу өрісінде NLP- ге жасалған үлгілерді салыстырып, екіншіден түрлендірушерге қатынау мүмкіндігін береміз. Содан кейін бұл үлгілерді бір түрлендірушілер негіздеген кодерлерден тексереміз. Көп сыныптардың көп саны бар деген тапсырманы анықтау үшін білетін. Біздің нәтижелеріміз ARSC деректер қорларында әдістер тең болғанда, бұл "Intent Detection" тапсырмасының әдісі емес. Ең жаңа және тапсырмалардың ең жақсы және қарапайым бағдарламаларының ескі және қарапайым бағдарла Біз сондай-ақ қарапайым негізгі сызық күшті. Барлық жаңа жасалған моделдер және оқу бағдарламасы жалғастырылады.', 'mk': 'Модерните модели на класификација се борат кога количината на анотирани податоци е мала. За да се надмине ова прашање, се појавија неколку нервни модели за класификација со неколку снимки, што предизвикаа значителен напредок со текот на времето, како во компјутерската визија, така и во природното јазичко процесување. Во последните, ваквите модели се користеа за да се потпираат на фиксни зборови вградени, пред присуството на трансформаторите. Additionally, some models used in Computer Vision are yet to be tested in NLP applications.  Во овој весник ги споредуваме сите овие модели, прво ги адаптираме оние направени во областа на обработувањето на слики на НЛП, и второ им обезбедуваме пристап до трансформаторите. Потоа ги тестираме овие модели опремени со ист кодер базиран на трансформатор на задачата за детекција на намерите, познат за голем број класи. Нашите резултати откриваат дека додека методите функционираат речиси еднакво на АРСК податоците, ова не е случајот за задачата за Детектирање на намерата, каде што најновите и наводно најдобрите конкуренти функционираат полошо од постарите и поедноставните (додека сите имаат пристап до трансформаторите Исто така покажуваме дека едноставната основа е изненадувачки силна. Сите нови развиени модели, како и рамката за проценка, се обезбедуваат јавно.', 'ml': 'ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d പൊരുതുന്നുണ്ട്. വിചാരിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങളുടെ അളവ് കുറവാണ്. ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തിന് വിജയിക്കാന്\u200d, കുറച്ച് നെയൂറല്\u200d വെടിവെക്കുന്ന ക്ലാസ്ഫോട്ട് മോഡലുകള്\u200d പുറപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. കാലത്തേക്കു അവസാനം, ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200d സ്ഥിരമായ വാക്കുകളില്\u200d ആശ്രയിച്ചിരുന്നു, മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ ആസ്ഥാനത്തിനു മുമ്പ്. കൂടുതല്\u200d NLP പ്രയോഗങ്ങളില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ചില മോഡലുകള്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നില്ല. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d എല്ലാ മോഡലുകളെയും തുല്യമാക്കുന്നു. ആദ്യം ചിത്രം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പ്രദേശത്ത് ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരുന്ന പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ മാതൃകങ്ങളെ പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു, ഒരുപാട് ക്ലാസുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത് തന്നെ സ്ഥാപിക് നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d വെളിപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു ARSC ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d രീതികള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d, ഇത് ഇന്റെന്റ് ഡിറ്ററിഷന്\u200d ജോലിയുടെ കേസ് അല്ല, അവ ഒരു ലളിതമായ ബെസ്ലൈന്\u200d വളരെ ശക്തിയാണെന്നും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. പുതിയ മോഡലുകളും വിലയിക്കുന്ന ഫ്രെയിമ്പുകളും പ്രത്യേകം ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നു.', 'mt': 'Mudelli moderni ta’ klassifikazzjoni għandhom it-tendenza li jfixklu meta l-ammont ta’ dejta annotata jkun skars. Biex tingħeleb din il-kwistjoni, ħarġu diversi mudelli newrali ta’ klassifikazzjoni b’ftit fotografiji, li wasslu għal progress sinifikanti maż-żmien, kemm fil-Viżjoni tal-Kompjuter kif ukoll fl-Ipproċessar tal-Lingwi Naturali. F’dan tal-aħħar, mudelli bħal dawn użati biex jiddependu fuq inkorporazzjonijiet fissi ta’ kliem, qabel ma jkun hemm trasformaturi. Barra minn hekk, xi mudelli użati fil-Viżjoni tal-Kompjuter għad iridu jiġu ttestjati fl-applikazzjonijiet NLP. F’dan id-dokument, aħna nqabblu dawn il-mudelli kollha, l-ewwel li tadatta dawk magħmula fil-qasam tal-ipproċessar tal-immaġni għall-NLP, u t-tieni li tipprovdihom aċċess għat-trasformaturi. Imbagħad nistestjaw dawn il-mudelli mgħammra bl-istess kodifikatur ibbażat fuq it-trasformatur fuq il-kompitu ta’ identifikazzjoni tal-intenzjoni, magħruf li għandu ammont kbir ta’ klassijiet. Ir-riżultati tagħna juru li filwaqt li l-metodi jwettqu kważi bl-istess mod fuq is-sett tad-dejta ARSC, dan mhuwiex il-każ għall-kompitu ta’ Detezzjoni bl-Intenzjoni, fejn l-aktar kompetituri reċenti u suppost l-aħjar iwettqu agħar minn dawk aktar anzjani u sempliċi (filwaqt li kulħadd jingħata aċċess għat-trasformaturi). Aħna nuru wkoll li linja bażi sempliċi hija sorprendentement qawwija. Il-mudelli l-ġodda kollha żviluppati kif ukoll il-qafas ta’ evalwazzjoni huma disponibbli għall-pubbliku.', 'no': 'Moderne klassifikasjonsmodular har tendens til å strømme når mengda oppmerkte data er kraftig. For å overføra dette problemet, har det oppstått fleire nøyralfå klassifikasjonsmodular, som gjer signifikante framdring over tid, både i datavising og naturspråksprosessering. I dei siste, slike modelane som vert brukte til å rely på fast ord-innbygging før transformeringsinnbygging. I tillegg vert nokre modeller brukte i datavising enno testa i NLP-program. I denne papiret sammenliknar vi alle desse modelane, første tilpassar dei som er lagt i biletprosesseringsfeltet til NLP, og andre tilgang til transformerer. Vi tester desse modelane derfor med same transformeringsbasert koder på oppgåva for oppdaging, kjent for å ha stor mengde klasser. Resultatet våre viser at mens metodane utfører nesten like på ARSC-datasettet, er dette ikkje tilfellet for Intent Detection-oppgåva, der dei siste og forhåpentlegvis beste konkurentene utfører verre enn eldre og enklere (mens alle er gitt tilgang til transformerande). Vi viser også at ein enkel baseline er overraska sterk. Alle nye utvikla modelane og evalueringsrammeverket blir tilgjengeleg offentlig.', 'mn': 'Орчин үеийн ангилалын загварууд санамсаргүй өгөгдлийн хэмжээ бага байх үед тулалдаг. Энэ асуудлыг давхарлахын тулд хэд хэдэн мэдрэлийн цөөн хэмжээний хуваалтын загварууд цаг хугацаанд маш чухал хөгжүүлэлт гарч ирсэн. Компьютерийн үзэл болон байгалийн хэл процессор хоёулаа Хамгийн сүүлийн үед ийм загварууд өөрчлөгчийн ирэхээс өмнө тогтмол үгнээс хамаарч байлаа. Түүнчлэн компьютерийн үзэл дээр хэрэглэгдсэн зарим загварууд NLP програмуудад шалгана. Энэ цаасан дээр бид эдгээр бүх загваруудыг харьцуулж, анхны зураг үйлдвэрлэлийн талбайд NLP-д хийгдсэн загваруудыг адаптаци болгож, хоёр дахь нь шилжүүлэгчид хүртэл хангалттай болгож байна. Дараа нь бид эдгээр загваруудыг ижил шилжүүлэгч дээр суурилсан кодлогчтой шалгаж, олон хэмжээний хичээлийн ажил дээр мэддэг. Бидний үр дүнд ARSC өгөгдлийн санд бараг адилхан үйлдвэрлэхэд энэ нь Intent Detection ажлын тухай биш юм. Хамгийн сүүлийн үед хамгийн сайн өрсөлдөгчдийн хуучин болон хялбар хүмүүсээс илүү зөв үйлдвэрлэгчдийн тухай санагдаж байна. Бид мөн энгийн суурь шугам гайхалтай хүчтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бүх шинэ хөгжигдсэн загварууд болон үнэлгээний хэмжээсүүд нийтэд ашигтай болдог.', 'el': 'Τα σύγχρονα μοντέλα ταξινόμησης τείνουν να αγωνίζονται όταν το ποσό των σχολιασμένων δεδομένων είναι σπάνιο. Για να ξεπεραστεί αυτό το ζήτημα, έχουν προκύψει αρκετά μοντέλα ταξινόμησης νευρωνικών λίγων πυροβολισμών, που αποφέρουν σημαντική πρόοδο με την πάροδο του χρόνου, τόσο στην Οπτική Υπολογιστή όσο και στην Επεξεργασία Φυσικής Γλώσσας. Στο τελευταίο, τέτοια μοντέλα συνήθιζαν να βασίζονται σε σταθερές ενσωμάτωση λέξεων, πριν την έλευση των μετασχηματιστών. Επιπλέον, ορισμένα μοντέλα που χρησιμοποιούνται στην Οπτική Υπολογιστή δεν έχουν ακόμη δοκιμαστεί σε εφαρμογές ΝΛΠ. Σε αυτή την εργασία, συγκρίνουμε όλα αυτά τα μοντέλα, προσαρμόζοντας πρώτα αυτά που κατασκευάζονται στον τομέα της επεξεργασίας εικόνας στο και, δεύτερον, παρέχοντας τους πρόσβαση σε μετασχηματιστές. Στη συνέχεια, δοκιμάζουμε αυτά τα μοντέλα εξοπλισμένα με τον ίδιο κωδικοποιητή βασισμένο στον μετασχηματιστή για την εργασία ανίχνευσης προθέσεων, γνωστό για την ύπαρξη μεγάλου αριθμού τάξεων. Τα αποτελέσματά μας αποκαλύπτουν ότι ενώ οι μέθοδοι αποδίδουν σχεδόν εξίσου στο σύνολο δεδομένων αυτό δεν ισχύει για την εργασία ανίχνευσης προθέσεων, όπου οι πιο πρόσφατοι και υποτιθέμενα καλύτεροι ανταγωνιστές αποδίδουν χειρότερα από τους παλαιότερους και απλούστερους (ενώ όλοι έχουν πρόσβαση σε μετασχηματιστές). Δείχνουμε επίσης ότι μια απλή γραμμή βάσης είναι εκπληκτικά ισχυρή. Όλα τα νέα αναπτυγμένα μοντέλα καθώς και το πλαίσιο αξιολόγησης διατίθενται στο κοινό.', 'sr': 'Moderni modeli klasifikacije se često bore kada je količina annotiranih podataka manja. Za prevladanje ovog pitanja, pojavilo se nekoliko neuroloških modela klasifikacije sa nekoliko pucnjava, pružajući značajan napredak tokom vremena, kako u kompjuterskoj viziji i procesu prirodnog jezika. U poslednjim slučajevima, takvi modeli su se oslanjali na određene reči, pre nego što su došli transformatori. Osim toga, neki modeli koji se koriste u kompjuterskoj viziji još uvek ne testiraju u NLP aplikaciji. U ovom papiru uspoređujemo sve te modele, prvo prilagođavanje onih koji su napravljeni na polju obrade slika NLP-u, a drugo im pružanje pristupa transformatorima. Onda testiramo te modele opremljene sa istom koderom na transformatoru na zadatku namjere, poznatom za veliku količinu klasa. Naši rezultati otkrivaju da, dok metode skoro jednako izvršavaju na kompletu podataka ARSC-a, to nije slučaj za zadatak Intent Detection-a, gde najskoriji i navodno najbolji konkurenti izvršavaju gore od starijih i jednostavnijih (dok su svi dobili pristup transformatorima). Takođe pokazujemo da je jednostavna početna linija iznenađujuće jaka. Svi novi razvijeni modeli kao i okvir procjene su javno dostupni.', 'ms': 'Model klasifikasi modern cenderung untuk berjuang apabila jumlah data yang dicatat jarang. Untuk mengatasi isu ini, beberapa model klasifikasi beberapa tembakan saraf telah muncul, memberikan kemajuan yang signifikan pada masa, kedua-dua dalam Pemandangan Komputer dan Pemprosesan Bahasa Alami. Dalam yang terakhir, model tersebut digunakan untuk bergantung pada pembenaman perkataan tetap, sebelum muncul pengubah. Lagipun, beberapa model yang digunakan dalam Pemandangan Komputer belum diuji dalam aplikasi NLP. Dalam kertas ini, kita membandingkan semua model ini, pertama menyesuaikan yang dibuat dalam medan pemprosesan imej kepada NLP, dan kedua menyediakan akses kepada pengubah. We then test these models equipped with the same transformer-based encoder on the intent detection task, known for having a large amount of classes.  Our results reveal that while methods perform almost equally on the ARSC dataset, this is not the case for the Intent Detection task, where most recent and supposedly best competitors perform worse than older and simpler ones (while all are are given access to transformers).  Kami juga menunjukkan bahawa asas sederhana adalah mengejutkan kuat. Semua model baru yang dikembangkan serta kerangka penilaian dibuat tersedia kepada masyarakat.', 'ro': 'Modelele moderne de clasificare tind să se lupte atunci când cantitatea de date adnotate este limitată. Pentru a depăși această problemă, au apărut mai multe modele neurale de clasificare cu câteva fotografii, obținând progrese semnificative în timp, atât în vederea calculatorului, cât și în procesarea limbajului natural. În aceasta din urmă, astfel de modele se bazau pe încorporări fixe de cuvinte, înainte de apariția transformatoarelor. În plus, unele modele utilizate în Computer Vision nu sunt încă testate în aplicațiile NLP. În această lucrare, comparăm toate aceste modele, mai întâi adaptându-le pe cele realizate în domeniul procesării imaginii la PNL, iar în al doilea rând oferindu-le acces la transformatoare. Testăm apoi aceste modele echipate cu același encoder bazat pe transformator pe sarcina de detectare a intenției, cunoscută pentru a avea un număr mare de clase. Rezultatele noastre arată că, în timp ce metodele funcționează aproape egal pe setul de date ARSC, acest lucru nu este cazul sarcinii de detectare a intențiilor, în care cei mai recenți și presupus cei mai buni concurenți performează mai rău decât cele mai vechi și mai simple (în timp ce toate au acces la transformatoare). De asemenea, arătăm că o bază de referință simplă este surprinzător de puternică. Toate noile modele dezvoltate, precum și cadrul de evaluare sunt puse la dispoziția publicului.', 'pl': 'Nowoczesne modele klasyfikacji mają tendencję do zmagań, gdy ilość adnotacji danych jest niewielka. Aby przezwyciężyć ten problem, pojawiło się kilka neuronowych modeli klasyfikacji kilku strzałów, przynoszących znaczący postęp z biegiem czasu, zarówno w obszarze widzenia komputerowego, jak i przetwarzania języka naturalnego. W tym ostatnim modele takie opierały się na stałych osadzeniach słów, przed pojawieniem się transformatorów. Ponadto niektóre modele stosowane w Computer Vision nie zostały jeszcze przetestowane w aplikacjach NLP. W artykule porównujemy wszystkie te modele, najpierw dostosowując te z zakresu przetwarzania obrazu do NLP, a po drugie zapewniając im dostęp do transformatorów. Następnie testujemy te modele wyposażone w ten sam koder oparty na transformatorze na zadaniu detekcji intencji, znany z dużej ilości klas. Nasze wyniki pokazują, że podczas gdy metody działają prawie równie równie na zbiorze danych ARSC, nie jest tak w przypadku zadania Intent Detection, gdzie najnowsi i rzekomo najlepsi konkurenci działają gorzej niż starsi i prostsi (podczas gdy wszyscy mają dostęp do transformatorów). Pokazujemy również, że prosta baza podstawowa jest zaskakująco silna. Wszystkie nowo opracowane modele oraz ramy oceny są udostępniane publicznie.', 'sv': 'Moderna klassificeringsmodeller tenderar att kämpa när mängden kommenterade data är knapp. För att övervinna detta problem har flera neurala modeller för klassificering av några slag framkommit, vilket ger betydande framsteg över tid, både inom datorseende och Natural Language Processing. I det senare brukade sådana modeller förlita sig på fasta ord inbäddningar, före tillkomsten av transformatorer. Dessutom har vissa modeller som används i Computer Vision ännu inte testats i NLP-applikationer. I denna uppsats jämför vi alla dessa modeller, först anpassar de som görs inom bildbehandling till NLP, och för det andra ger dem tillgång till transformatorer. Vi testar sedan dessa modeller utrustade med samma transformatorbaserade encoder på avsiktsdetekteringsuppgiften, känd för att ha en stor mängd klasser. Våra resultat visar att medan metoderna presterar nästan lika på ARSC-datauppsättningen, är detta inte fallet för Intent Detection-uppgiften, där de senaste och förmodade bästa konkurrenterna presterar sämre än äldre och enklare (medan alla ges tillgång till transformatorer). Vi visar också att en enkel baslinje är förvånansvärt stark. Alla nya utvecklade modeller samt utvärderingsramen görs tillgängliga för allmänheten.', 'ur': 'مدرن کلاسپیٹ موڈل جہاد کرتے ہیں جب انٹیٹ ڈیٹا کی مقدار کم ہوتی ہے۔ اس مسئلہ پر غالب ہونے کے لئے بہت سے نئورل تھوڑے شیٹ کلاسپیٹ کے نمونے ظاہر ہوئے ہیں، زمانہ میں اثر اثر دینے والے ہیں، کامپیوتر ویزیون اور طبیعی زبان پردازی میں. پچھلوں میں ایسے نمونے ہیں جو تغییر کرنے والوں کے آجانے سے پہلے مضبوط کلمات پر بھروسہ کرتے تھے اور اضافہ، کمپیوٹر ویزیون میں استعمال کئی نمڈل NLP کاربریوں میں آزمائش کی جاتی ہیں۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم نے تمام مدلکوں کو مقایسہ کیا ہے، پہلے ان کو NLP کے مطابق تصویر پرسس کے مطابق بنایا ہے، اور دوسرے سے ان کو تبدیل کرنے والوں کے لئے دسترسی دیتے ہیں۔ پھر ہم ان موڈلوں کو آزمائش کریں جو ایک طرح کی تغییر دینے کے ذریعہ ایک طرح کی تغییر دینے والی کوڈر کے ساتھ تیار کئے گئے ہیں اور بہت سی کلاس کے ذریعہ معلوم ہوتے ہیں ہمارے نتیجے ظاہر کرتے ہیں کہ جب ARSC ڈیٹ سٹ پر تقریبا برابر عمل کریں تو یہ Intent Detection Task کے کیس نہیں ہے جہاں اچھے اور گمان میں بہترین رقابت کرنے والے بوڑھے اور سادھے سے بدتر عمل کرتے ہیں (حالانکہ سب تغییر کرنے والوں کے لئے دسترسی دی جاتی ہے)۔ ہم بھی دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایک ساده بنسٹ لین تعجب سے طاقتور ہے۔ تمام نئی توسعہ دیے ہوئے نمڈلوں اور ارزیابی فرمول ظاہر طور پر موجود ہیں.', 'ta': 'Modern classification models tend to struggle when the amount of annotated data is scarce.  இந்த பிரச்சனையை வெற்றி பெற, பல புதிய சில பிரிவு வகுப்பு மாதிரிகள் வெளியேறியது, கணிப்பொறி பார்வை மற்றும் இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாட் இறுதியில், இந்த மாதிரிகள் மாற்றங்களின் வழக்கத்திற்கு முன்னால் நிலையான வார்த்தை உள்ளடக்கத்தில் நம்பி கூடுதலாக, கணினி பார்வையில் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட சில மாதிரிகள் NLP பயன்பாடுகளில் சோதிக்கப்படவில்லை. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் எல்லா மாதிரிகளையும் ஒப்பிடுகிறோம், முதலில் பிம்பத்தின் புலத்தில் செய்யப்பட்ட பிம்பத்தை NLP க்கு  பின்னர் நாம் இந்த மாதிரிகளை சோதிக்க வேண்டும் அதே மாற்றம் அடிப்படையிலான குறியீட்டின் செயல்பாட்டில் தெரியும் நி நம் முடிவு ஒரு சுலபமான அடிப்படைக்கோடு ஆச்சரியமாக இருக்கும் என்பதை நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம். அனைத்து புதிய உருவாக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளும் evaluation சட்டத்தையும் பொதுவாக கிடைக்கும்.', 'si': 'අධ්\u200dයාත්මක විශේෂණ මොඩේල්ස් වලට ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා කියලා  මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න, වෙලාවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි, පරිගණක දර්ශනය සහ ප්\u200dරාකෘතික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  අන්තිම වලින්, අන්තිම වර්තනයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන්. තවත්, පරිගණකය දර්ශනයේ භාවිත වෙන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙන්නේ NLP යෝජනයේ පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න. මේ පත්තරේ අපි මේ හැම මොඩල් එක්ක සමුදානම් කරනවා, මුලින්ම පින්තූර පරීක්ෂණයේ පින්තූර පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරතියෝජනයේ ප ඊට පස්සේ අපි මේ මොඩල් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා එකම වෙනස් පරීක්ෂකයෙන් ආධාරිත සංකේතකයෙන් අදහස් පරීක්ෂා වැඩක් විතරයි,  අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ ARSC දත්ත සූදානයට පරිස්සම් විදියට පරිස්සම් කරනවා කියලා, මේක Intent Detection ක්\u200dරියාවට පරිස්සම් වෙන්නේ නැහැ කියලා, තවත් අල අපිට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් බලයි. හැම අලුත් විකාශ කරපු මොඩල් වලින් විකාශ කරපු මොඩල් වලින් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප', 'so': 'Tusaalooyinka fasaxa hore waa inay la dagaalamaan marka tirada macluumaadka la dhibaateeyo ay yaraan. Si ay uga adkaato arimahan, waxaa soo baxay tusaalooyin kala duduwan oo neural yar oo kala duduwan, waxaana soo saaray horumar aad u weyn waqti ka badan, xiliga muuqashada Computer iyo Processing afka asalka ah. Ugu dambaysta, tusaalooyinkaas waxay ku kalsoonaan jireen hadal saxda ah, ka hor inta aan soo wareegayn beddelka. Sidoo kale tusaalooyin kambiyuutarka lagu isticmaalayo aan weli lagu imtixaamo codsiga NLP. Qoraalkan waxaynu isbarbardhignaa tusaalahaas oo dhan, marka hore waxaynu beddelinaynaa kuwa lagu sameeyay beerta sawirka oo lagu sameeyo NLP, labaadna waxaynu siinaynaa si ay u helaan wax beddelasho. We then test these models equipped with the same transformer-based encoder on the intent detection task, known for having a large amount of classes.  Abaalkayaga waxay muuqataa in marka qaababka lagu sameeyo si isku mid ah ee ARSC-ka, taasi ma aha xaalad lagu sameeyo shaqo la hubsado Internetka, meesha ay ugu dambeysay oo ugu macquul yihiin in khiyaano-tartanku ay sameeyaan wax ka sii liita waayeelka iyo sahlan (inta la siiyo wax walba in la beddelo). Sidoo kale waxaynu muujinnaa in shabakadda fudud ay xoog badan tahay. Dhammaan noocyada cusub ee horumarinta iyo dhaqanka qiimeynta waxaa si bayaan ah loo heli karaa.', 'vi': 'Mô hình phân loại hiện đại có xu hướng tranh đấu khi lượng dữ liệu được ghi chú rất hiếm. Để vượt qua vấn đề này, đã xuất hiện một số mô hình phân hạng vài phát thần kinh của hệ thần kinh, mang lại một tiến bộ đáng kể qua thời gian, cả trong Máy tính Vision và Quá trình ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Trong vụ này, những mô hình này được dùng để dựa vào sự nhúng vào từ cố định, trước khi sự ra đời của những người biến đổi. Thêm vào đó, một số mẫu được dùng trong Máy tính Vision còn chưa được thử nghiệm trong ứng dụng NLP. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta so sánh tất cả các mô hình này, đầu tiên sửa chúng trong lĩnh vực xử lý hình ảnh thành lập tới Njala, và sau đó cung cấp cho chúng quyền truy cập vào bộ máy biến đổi. Chúng tôi kiểm tra những mô hình này được trang bị cùng một bộ mã hóa dựa vào nhiệm vụ tìm ra mục đích, được biết đến vì có nhiều lớp học. Những kết quả của chúng ta cho thấy rằng trong khi các phương pháp thực hiện gần giống nhau trên tập tin ARSC, đây không phải là trường hợp của nhiệm vụ trinh sát dự định, nơi các đối thủ gần đây và được cho là tốt nhất thực hiện tệ hơn những người già và đơn giản hơn (trong khi tất cả đều được phép truy cập vào bộ máy biến thế). Chúng tôi cũng cho thấy một cơ sở đơn giản mạnh tới ngạc nhiên. Tất cả những mẫu mới được phát triển cũng như bộ phận đánh giá được công bố công khai.', 'uz': "Name Bu muammolarni oshirish uchun bir necha neyrolik shakllangan darajalashtirish modellari topildi. Kompyuterni koʻrish va tabiiy tillar jarayonlarida juda muhim rivojlanadi. Keyingi esa, bu modellar o'zgarishlarni boshlashdan oldin qoʻllanilgan so'zlarni ishlatadi. @ info Bu qogʻozda biz hamma modellarni kamaytamiz, birinchi rasmning maydonida yaratilgan narsalarni NLP bilan birinchi o'zgarishga ega qilamiz. Keyin biz bu modellarni bir necha sinfni tasavvur qilish vazifasi bilan ishlab chiqaramiz. Bizning natijalarimiz ARSC maʼlumotlari bajarayotganda, bu narsani qidirish vazifasi emas. Bu yerda eng yaxshi va yaxshi rivojlanuvchilar yomon va oddiy narsalarni bajariladi (hamma narsalarni o'zgartirishga ruxsat beradi). Biz esa oddiy asboblarning asboblarini ko'rsatishimiz mumkin. @ info: status", 'nl': 'Moderne classificatiemodellen hebben de neiging te worstelen wanneer de hoeveelheid geannoteerde gegevens schaars is. Om dit probleem op te lossen, zijn verscheidene neurale weinige-shot classificatiemodellen ontstaan, die aanzienlijke vooruitgang in de loop van de tijd opleveren, zowel in Computer Vision als Natural Language Processing. In de laatste waren dergelijke modellen vroeger afhankelijk van vaste woordinbeddingen, vóór de komst van transformatoren. Bovendien moeten sommige modellen die worden gebruikt in Computer Vision nog worden getest in NLP-toepassingen. In dit artikel vergelijken we al deze modellen, waarbij we eerst de modellen op het gebied van beeldverwerking aanpassen aan NLP, en ten tweede hen toegang bieden tot transformatoren. Vervolgens testen we deze modellen uitgerust met dezelfde transformator-gebaseerde encoder op de intentiedetectie taak, bekend om het hebben van een groot aantal klassen. Onze resultaten tonen aan dat hoewel methoden bijna gelijk presteren op de ARSC dataset, dit niet het geval is voor de Intent Detection taak, waar de meest recente en zogenaamd beste concurrenten slechter presteren dan oudere en eenvoudigere (terwijl allen toegang krijgen tot transformatoren). We laten ook zien dat een eenvoudige baseline verrassend sterk is. Alle nieuw ontwikkelde modellen en het evaluatiekader worden openbaar gemaakt.', 'bg': 'Съвременните модели на класификация са склонни да се борят, когато количеството анотирани данни е оскъдно. За да се преодолее този проблем, се появиха няколко невронни модела за класификация с няколко изстрела, които доведоха до значителен напредък във времето, както в компютърното зрение, така и в обработката на естествения език. В последния такива модели разчитаха на фиксирани вграждания на думи преди появата на трансформаторите. Освен това някои модели, използвани в компютърното виждане, тепърва предстои да бъдат тествани в приложения за НЛП. В тази статия сравняваме всички тези модели, като първо адаптираме тези, направени в областта на обработката на изображения към НЛО, и второ им предоставяме достъп до трансформатори. След това тестваме тези модели, оборудвани със същия трансформаторен кодер на базата на задачата за откриване на намерение, известна с това, че имат голямо количество класове. Резултатите ни показват, че макар методите да работят почти еднакво върху набора от данни, това не е случаят със задачата за откриване на намерения, където най-новите и предполагаемо най-добрите конкуренти се представят по-зле от по-старите и по-прости (докато всички имат достъп до трансформатори). Също така показваме, че простата базова линия е изненадващо силна. Всички нови разработени модели, както и рамката за оценка са публично достъпни.', 'hr': 'Moderni modeli klasifikacije se često bore kada je količina annotiranih podataka manja. Za prevladanje ovog pitanja, pojavilo se nekoliko modela klasifikacije neuronskih nekoliko snimaka, koji su donosili značajan napredak tijekom vremena, kako u računalnom viziji i procesu prirodnog jezika. U posljednjim slučajevima, takvi modeli su se oslanjali na određene riječi, prije dolaska transformatora. Osim toga, neki modeli koji se koriste u viziji kompjutera još nisu testirani u aplikaciji NLP-a. U ovom papiru uspoređujemo sve te modele, prvo prilagođavajući one napravljene u polju obrade slika NLP-u, a drugo im pružajući pristup transformatorima. Tada testiramo te modele opremljene sa istom koderom na transformatoru na zadatku namjere otkrivanja, poznatom za veliku količinu klasa. Naši rezultati otkrivaju da, iako metode skoro jednako izvršavaju na kompletu podataka ARSC-a, to nije slučaj za zadatak Intent Detection-a, gdje najnoviji i navodno najbolji konkurenti izvršavaju gore od starijih i jednostavnijih (dok su svi dobili pristup transformatorima). Također pokazujemo da je jednostavna početna linija iznenađujuće snažna. Svi novi razvijeni modeli kao i okvir procjene su javno dostupni.', 'da': 'Moderne klassifikationsmodeller har tendens til at kæmpe, når mængden af annoterede data er knappe. For at løse dette problem er adskillige neurale få-skud klassifikationsmodeller dukket op, hvilket har givet betydelige fremskridt over tid, både i Computer Vision og Natural Language Processing. I sidstnævnte bruges sådanne modeller til at stole på faste ord indlejringer, før fremkomsten af transformatorer. Desuden er nogle modeller, der anvendes i Computer Vision, endnu ikke testet i NLP-applikationer. I denne artikel sammenligner vi alle disse modeller, først tilpasser dem, der er lavet inden for billedbehandling til NLP, og for det andet giver dem adgang til transformere. Vi tester derefter disse modeller udstyret med samme transformerbaserede encoder på intent detection opgaven, kendt for at have en stor mængde klasser. Vores resultater viser, at mens metoder fungerer næsten lige på ARSC datasættet, er dette ikke tilfældet med Intent Detection opgaven, hvor de seneste og angiveligt bedste konkurrenter klarer sig dårligere end ældre og enklere (mens alle får adgang til transformere). Vi viser også, at en simpel basislinje er overraskende stærk. Alle de nyudviklede modeller samt evalueringsrammerne gøres offentligt tilgængelige.', 'id': 'Model klasifikasi modern cenderung untuk berjuang ketika jumlah data yang dicatat jarang. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, beberapa model klasifikasi beberapa penembak saraf telah muncul, memberikan kemajuan yang signifikan sepanjang waktu, baik dalam Visual Komputer dan Proses Bahasa Alami. In the latter, such models used to rely on fixed word embeddings, before the advent of transformers.  Selain itu, beberapa model yang digunakan dalam Computer Vision belum diuji dalam aplikasi NLP. Dalam kertas ini, kita membandingkan semua model ini, pertama-tama mengadaptasi yang dibuat dalam bidang proses gambar ke NLP, dan kedua menyediakan akses ke transformer. Kemudian kita menguji model-model ini disediakan dengan koder yang sama berdasarkan transformer pada tugas deteksi niat, dikenal untuk memiliki jumlah besar kelas. Hasil kami mengungkapkan bahwa sementara metode berhasil hampir sama pada set data ARSC, ini bukan kasus untuk tugas Deteksi Intent, di mana kompetitor terbaik dan seharusnya terbaik berhasil lebih buruk dari yang lebih tua dan sederhana (sementara semua diberikan akses kepada transformer). Kami juga menunjukkan bahwa dasar dasar sederhana sangat kuat. Semua model baru yang dikembangkan serta cadangan evaluasi dibuat publik tersedia.', 'sw': 'Mfano wa usambazaji wa sasa unaendelea kupambana pale kiasi cha taarifa zinapotangazwa ni vigumu. Ili kushinda suala hili, mifano kadhaa ya usambazaji wa aina ndogo ya ubongo imejitokeza, na kusababisha maendeleo makubwa kwa muda mwingine, hata katika Maoni ya Kompyuta na Utafiti wa Lugha za asili. Mwisho, mifano kama hii ilitumia kutegemea maneno madhubuti, kabla ya kuanza kwa mabadiliko. Kwa nyongeza, baadhi ya mifano iliyotumika kwenye Visheni ya kompyuta bado hazijaribiwa katika matumizi ya NLP. Katika gazeti hili, tunalinganisha mifano yote hii, kwa mara ya kwanza kuwachanganya zile zilizotengenezwa kwenye eneo la kuchungua picha na NLP, na pili tunawaruza upatikanaji wa mabadiliko. Kisha tunajaribu mifano haya yenye kiwango hicho cha mabadiliko kwa lengo la kutambua, kinachofahamika kwa kuwa na darasa kubwa. Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kuwa wakati mbinu za kutekeleza takwimu za ARSC, hii si jambo kwa ajili ya kazi ya Uchunguzi wa Intaneti, ambapo washindi bora zaidi wanafanya vibaya zaidi ya wazee na rahisi (wakati wote wanapewa upatikanaji wa mabadiliko). Tunaonyesha pia kuwa msingi rahisi ni imara kwa kushangaza. Mifano yote mpya zilizoendelea pamoja na mfumo wa uchunguzi unapatikana hadharani.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای مختصات مدرن در زمانی که مقدار داده\u200cهای ناشناخته\u200cشده کم است مبارزه می\u200cکنند. برای تغییر این مسئله، چندین مدل\u200cهای مختصات عصبی چند بار در طول زمان، پیشرفت بزرگی را در نظر کامپیوتر و تحلیل زبان طبیعی به وجود آورده است. در آخرین، این مدل\u200cها قبل از پیشرفت تغییردهندگان به کلمه\u200cهای ثابت اعتماد می\u200cکردند. به اضافه، بعضی از مدل\u200cهای استفاده در دید کامپیوتر هنوز در کاربردهای NLP آزمایش می\u200cشوند. در این کاغذ، ما تمام این مدلها را مقایسه می کنیم، اولین بار آنها را در زمینه پردازش تصویر به NLP ساخته می کنیم، و دومین بار آنها را دسترسی به تغییرگران می دهیم. سپس این مدلها را آزمایش می کنیم که با یک کودهر متغییر بر روی کار شناسایی هدف، معلوم شده است که کلاس زیادی داشته باشد. نتیجه\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که در حالی که روش\u200cها تقریباً همانند روی مجموعه داده\u200cهای ARSC انجام می\u200cدهند، این پرونده برای کار شناسایی Intent نیست، جایی که اخیرا و گمان می\u200cکند بهترین رقابت\u200cکنندگان از سن\u200cتر و ساده\u200cتر انجام می\u200cدهند (در حالی که همه به تغییر\u200cکنند ما همچنین نشان می دهیم که یک خط پایین ساده خیلی قوی است. تمام مدل\u200cهای جدید توسعه شده و چهارچوب ارزیابی به طور عمومی در دسترس می\u200cشوند.', 'de': 'Moderne Klassifizierungsmodelle neigen dazu, Probleme zu haben, wenn die Menge an annotierten Daten knapp ist. Um dieses Problem zu überwinden, wurden mehrere neurale Weniger-Schuss-Klassifikationsmodelle entwickelt, die im Laufe der Zeit signifikante Fortschritte sowohl in der Computer Vision als auch in der Natural Language Processing erzielt haben. In letzterem stützten sich solche Modelle vor dem Aufkommen von Transformatoren auf feste Worteinbettungen. Darüber hinaus müssen einige Modelle, die in Computer Vision verwendet werden, noch in NLP-Anwendungen getestet werden. In diesem Beitrag vergleichen wir alle diese Modelle, indem wir erstens diejenigen aus dem Bereich der Bildverarbeitung an NLP anpassen und zweitens ihnen Zugang zu Transformatoren gewähren. Anschließend testen wir diese Modelle, die mit demselben transformatorbasierten Encoder für die Intent Detection Task ausgestattet sind und dafür bekannt sind, eine große Anzahl von Klassen zu haben. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass Methoden zwar fast gleich auf dem ARSC-Datensatz funktionieren, dies jedoch nicht der Fall ist für die Intent Detection-Aufgabe, bei der die neuesten und vermeintlich besten Konkurrenten schlechter abschneiden als ältere und einfachere (während alle Zugriff auf Transformatoren erhalten). Wir zeigen auch, dass eine einfache Grundlinie überraschend stark ist. Alle neu entwickelten Modelle sowie der Evaluationsrahmen werden öffentlich zugänglich gemacht.', 'ko': '현대 분류 모델은 종종 주석 데이터량이 희박한 상황에서 곤경에 빠진다.이 문제를 극복하기 위해 몇 가지 신경 소렌즈 분류 모델이 등장했고 시간의 추이에 따라 컴퓨터 시각과 자연 언어 처리 분야에서 중대한 진전을 거두었다.후자에서 트랜스포머가 등장하기 전에 이런 모델은 보통 고정어 삽입에 의존한다.또한 컴퓨터 시각에서 사용되는 일부 모델은 NLP 응용 프로그램에서 테스트되지 않았습니다.본고에서 우리는 모든 모델을 비교했다. 먼저 이미지 처리 분야의 모델을 NLP로 개편한 다음에 변압기에 접근할 수 있도록 했다.그리고 우리는 의도적인 검측 임무 테스트에 따라 같은 변압기를 기반으로 한 인코더 모델을 설치했는데 이 임무는 대량의 종류를 가지고 있는 것으로 유명하다.우리의 결과에 따르면 방법은 ARSC 데이터 집합에서의 성능은 거의 같지만 의도 검측 임무의 상황은 그렇지 않다. 의도 검측 임무에서 최신과 가장 좋은 경쟁자로 여겨지는 성능은 구형과 더 간단한 경쟁사보다 떨어진다(변압기에 접근할 수 있는 사람).우리는 또 간단한 기선이 놀랄 정도로 강하다는 것을 보여 주었다.모든 새로 개발된 모델과 평가 프레임워크가 공개적으로 제공된다.', 'af': "Moderne klassifikasie modele het tendens om te struikel wanneer die hoeveelheid van notateerde data skaars is. Om hierdie probleem te oorwin, het 'n paar neurale skoot klassifikasie modele opgekom, wat betekende vordering oor tyd gee, beide in Rekenaar Besigtiging en Natuurlike Taal Prosessering. In die laaste, sodanige modele gebruik word om op vaste woord inbettings te vertrou voor die aankoms van transformers. Additionally, some models used in Computer Vision are yet to be tested in NLP applications. In hierdie papier vergelyk ons al hierdie modele, eerste aanpassing van die gemaak in die veld van beeldverwerking na NLP, en tweede verskaf hulle toegang tot transformers. Ons toets dan hierdie modele wat beskikbaar is met dieselfde transformer-gebaseerde enkoder op die doel opdekking taak, bekend vir 'n groot hoeveelheid klasse. Ons resultate vertoon dat terwyl metodes amper gelyk uitvoer op die ARSC datastel, hierdie is nie die geval vir die Intent Opdekking taak nie, waar die mees onlangste en veronderstel beste mededingers vervul beter as ouer en eenvoudige (terwyl almal is gegee toegang tot transformeerders). Ons wys ook dat 'n eenvoudige basislien verwonderbaar sterk is. Alle nuwe ontwikkelde modele en die evalueringsraamwerk is openlik beskikbaar.", 'tr': 'Modern klasifikasyýa nusgalary nähili tanyş hasaplanýan maglumatyň azalygyna mücadele edýärler. Bu meseleyi üstünleştirmek üçin birnäçe näsir atly çarpyş taýýarlama nusgalarynyň biri wagtyň içinde hem kompýuter Görnüşi hem Tebiýal dil işlemlerinde örän möhüm ilerlemesi bar. Soňky nusgalarda, transformatçylar gelmeden öň takyk söz integrasyna ynanýarlar. Ümäpli, Kompýuter Görnüşinde ullanylan käbir nusgalar NLP uygulamalarynda testi edilmek üçin ýok. Bu kagyzda, biz bu nusgalaryň hemmesini karşılaşdyrýarys, ilkinji gezek NLP bilen surat işlemegi sahypynda edenlere üýtgeýäris we ikinjisi olara transformatçlara rugsat berýäris. Sonra bu modelleri bir transformer tabanly kodeýan hasaplamak üçin beýleki topar üçin bilinýär. Biziň netijelerimiz ARSC datum setinde deň ýagdaýynda edip biljek ýaly, bu Intent Deteksi işi üçin däldir. Soňky we olaryň iň gowy jogapkärleri uly we ýeňil däldir (hemme işleri transformatçylara berilýär). Biz hem basit temel çizginiň gaty güýçlidigini görkeýäris. Hemme täze gelişmiş nusgalar we çykyş çerçevesi publika meşgullanýar.', 'am': 'የአሁኑ ክፍል ምሳሌዎች የዳታ ቁጥር ጥቂት ሲሆን ይጋጠማሉ። ይህንን ጉዳይ ለማሸንፍ፣ ብዙ የናውሬው ጥቂት የተነሳ የክፍለ መተላለፊያ ሞዴላዎች በኮምፒዩተር ራእይ እና የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ፕሮግራም ሲያሳየፉ፡፡ በመጨረሻው፣ እንደነዚህ ዓይነት ምሳሌዎች ለወጥቶ ከመስጠት በፊት በተመሳሳይ ቃላት መደገፍ ይታመካሉ፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ኮምፒዩተር ተመልከት ውስጥ የሚጠቀሙት ምሳሌዎች ገና በNLP ፕሮግራሞች ውስጥ ሊፈትኑ አልተቻለም። በዚህ ካላት፣ እነዚህን ምሳሌዎች ሁሉ እናሳያታለን፣ በመጀመሪያ ከNLP ጋር የተደረጉትን የምስል እርሻ እና ሁለተኛውም ለለውጦች ማግኘት እናደርጋቸዋለን፡፡ በዚያን ጊዜም ብዙ ተማርኮች በመኖርበት በሚታወቀው፣ በተለወጠው የፊደል ኮድ ላይ ያሉትን ምሳሌዎች እንሞክራለን፡፡ Our results reveal that while methods perform almost equally on the ARSC dataset, this is not the case for the Intent Detection task, where most recent and supposedly best competitors perform worse than older and simpler ones (while all are are given access to transformers).  እናም ቀላል መሠረቶች ኃይለኛ እንደሆነ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ አዲስ ደጋፊዎች ሁሉ እና ማስታወቂያው ፍሬም በህዝብ የተገኘ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Նորակայական դասակարգման մոդելները հակված են պայքարել, երբ գրված տվյալների քանակը հազվադեպ է: Այս խնդիրը հաղթահարելու համար բազմաթիվ նյարդային փոքր դասակարգման մոդելներ են առաջացել, ինչը ժամանակի ընթացքում մեծ առաջընթաց է բերում, ինչպես համակարգչային տեսողության, ինչպես նաև բնական լեզվի վերլուծության մեջ: Վերջերում, այսպիսի մոդելները հիմնված էին հաստատուն բառերի ներդրման վրա, մինչ վերափոխողների հայտնվելը: Ավելին, որոշ մոդելներ, որոնք օգտագործվում են համակարգչային տեսողության մեջ, դեռևս պետք է փորձարկեն ՆԼՊ-ի ծրագրերում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք համեմատում ենք այս բոլոր մոդելները, առաջինը հարմարեցնում ենք պատկերների վերամշակման ոլորտում արված մոդելները ՆԼՊ-ի հետ, երկրորդը՝ տրամադրելով նրանց վերամշակողների հնարավորություն: Այնուհետև մենք փորձում ենք այս մոդելները, որոնք ունեն նույն վերափոխողի հիմնված կոդերը մտադրության հայտնաբերման խնդրի վրա, որը հայտնի է շատ դասեր ունենալու համար: Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մինչդեռ մեթոդները գրեթե հավասար են աշխատում ARCS տվյալների համակարգում, սա Ուզում է հայտնաբերել խնդիրը չէ, որտեղ վերջին և ենթադրաբար լավագույն մրցակիցները ավելի վատ են աշխատում, քան հին և պարզ մրցակիցները (մինչդեռ բոլորին We also show that a simple baseline is surprisingly strong.  Բոլոր նոր զարգացած մոդելները, ինչպես նաև գնահատման շրջանակները հանրային հասանելի են դարձնում:', 'az': 'Modern klasifikasyon modelləri məlumatların çox az olduğu zaman mübahisə edirlər. Bu məsələnin üstünə gəlməsi üçün, bir neçə nöral çoxlu şəkil klasifikasiya modeli vaxtlarda möhkəm ilerleme yaratdı, Kompüter Görünüş və Təbiətli Dil işləməsində də. Sonrada, bu modellər transformatçıların gəlməsindən əvvəl sabit sözlərə təvəkkül edirdilər. Əksinə, Kompüter Gözünün bəzi modelləri NLP proqramlarında hələ imtaha edilməlidir. Bu kağızda, bu modelləri ilk dəfə NLP ilə yaratdığımız görüntü işləməsi sahəsindəki modelləri və ikinci dəyişikliklərə erişiklik sağlayacağıq. Sonra bu modelləri bir transformer-tabanlı kodlayıcı ilə istifadə edirik, böyük nümunə sahib olduğu üçün tanınmış fikirləşdirilmiş işlərdə. Sonuçlarımız göstərir ki, ARSC verilən qutusunda metodlar neredeyse eyni ola bilərsə, bu Intent Detection işi üçün deyildir. Ən son və sanırım ən yaxşı müharibəçilər yaşlı və daha asanlıqlardan daha pis işlər edirlər. Biz də təəccüblü səviyyədə çox güclü olduğunu göstəririk. Bütün yeni gelişmiş modellər və değerləşdirmə qurğusu açıq-aşkar faydalanır.', 'ca': "Modens models de classificació tendeixen a lluitar quan la quantitat de dades anotates és escasa. To overcome this issue, several neural few-shot classification models have emerged, yielding significant progress over time, both in Computer Vision and Natural Language Processing.  En aquests últims, aquests models es basaven en integracions de paraules fixes, abans de l'aparició dels transformadors. A més, alguns models utilitzats en Computer Vision encara no han de ser testats en aplicacions NLP. En aquest paper, comparem tots aquests models, primer adaptant els fets en el camp del processament d'imatge a NLP, i segon proporcionant-los accés a transformadors. Ens posarem a prova aquests models equipats amb el mateix codificador basat en transformadors en la tasca de detecció de intencions, conegut per tenir una gran quantitat de classes. Els nostres resultats revelen que mentre que els mètodes actuen gairebé igualment en el conjunt de dades ARSC, això no és el cas de la tasca de detecció d'intenció, on els millors competidors actuen pitjor que els més vells i més senzills (mentre tots tenen accés a transformadors). També demostram que una base simple és sorprenentment forta. Tots els nous models desenvolupats i el marc d'evaluació estan publicament disponibles.", 'bs': 'Moderni modeli klasifikacije se često bore kada je količina annotiranih podataka manja. Za prevladanje ovog pitanja, pojavilo se nekoliko neuroloških modela klasifikacije sa nekoliko snimaka, koji su doneli značajan napredak tijekom vremena, kako u kompjuterskom viziji i procesu prirodnog jezika. U posljednjem, takvi modeli su se oslanjali na određene riječi, prije nego što su došli transformatori. Osim toga, neki modeli koji se koriste u kompjuterskoj viziji još uvijek neće testirati u NLP aplikaciji. U ovom papiru uspoređujemo sve te modele, prvo prilagođavajući one napravljene na polju obrade slika NLP-u, a drugo im pružajući pristup transformatorima. Onda testiramo te modele opremljene sa istim koderom na transformatoru na zadatku namjere otkrivanja, poznatim za veliku količinu klasa. Naši rezultati otkrivaju da dok metode skoro jednako izvršavaju na ARSC podacima, to nije slučaj za zadatak Intent Detection, gdje najskoriji i navodno najbolji konkurenti čine gore od starijih i jednostavnijih (dok su svi dobili pristup transformatorima). Također pokazujemo da je jednostavna početna linija iznenađujuće jaka. Svi novi razvijeni modeli kao i okvir procjene su javno dostupni.', 'sq': 'Modelet moderne klasifikuese tenderojnë të luftojnë kur sasia e të dhënave të shënuara është e paktë. Për të kapërcyer këtë çështje, janë shfaqur disa modele klasifikimi nervor me pak fotografi, duke dhënë përparim të rëndësishëm me kalimin e kohës, si në vizionin e kompjuterit ashtu edhe në procesimin e gjuhës natyrore. Në të fundit, modele të tilla përdoreshin për të mbështetur në përfshirje të fjalëve të fiksuara, para se të vinin transformuesit. Përveç kësaj, disa modele të përdorura në Computer Vision janë ende për të testuar në aplikimet NLP. Në këtë letër, ne krahasojmë të gjitha këto modele, së pari duke i përshtatur ato që janë bërë në fushën e procesimit të imazheve me NLP, dhe së dyti duke u dhënë atyre akses në transformuesit. We then test these models equipped with the same transformer-based encoder on the intent detection task, known for having a large amount of classes.  Rezultatet tona zbulojnë se ndërsa metodat funksionojnë pothuajse në mënyrë të barabartë në grupin e të dhënave ARSC, kjo nuk është rasti për detyrën e zbulimit me qëllim, ku konkurrentët më të fundit dhe supozohet më të mirë funksionojnë më keq se ato më të vjetra dhe më të thjeshta (ndërsa të gjithë i jepet akses transformuesve). Ne gjithashtu tregojmë se një bazë e thjeshtë është befasueshëm e fortë. Të gjitha modelet e rinj të zhvilluar si dhe kuadri i vlerësimit janë bërë të disponueshëm publikisht.', 'cs': 'Moderní klasifikační modely mají tendenci potíže, když množství anotovaných dat je vzácné. K překonání tohoto problému se objevilo několik neuronových klasifikačních modelů několika záběrů, které přinesly významný pokrok v průběhu času, jak v oblasti počítačového vidění, tak zpracování přirozeného jazyka. V druhém případě se tyto modely spoléhaly na pevné vložení slov před příchodem transformátorů. Navíc některé modely používané v počítačovém vidění musí být ještě testovány v aplikacích NLP. V tomto článku porovnáváme všechny tyto modely, nejprve přizpůsobujeme ty z oblasti zpracování obrazu NLP a za druhé jim poskytujeme přístup k transformátorům. Následně testujeme tyto modely vybavené stejným snímačem založeným na transformátoru na úkolu detekce záměru, známé velkým množstvím tříd. Naše výsledky ukazují, že zatímco metody fungují téměř stejně na datové sadě ARSC, není tomu tak u úlohy Intent Detection, kde nejnovější a údajně nejlepší konkurenti vykonávají horší než starší a jednodušší (zatímco všichni mají přístup k transformátorům). Také ukazujeme, že jednoduchá základna je překvapivě silná. Všechny nově vyvinuté modely i rámec hodnocení jsou zpřístupněny veřejně.', 'bn': 'আধুনিক শ্রেণীকরণ মডেল সংগ্রাম করে যখন বিরক্তিকর তথ্য কম। এই বিষয়টিকে জয়ী করার জন্য, কয়েকটি নিউরেল গুলি শ্রেণীবিভাগ মডেল উঠেছে, যার ফলে সময়ের বেশীর ভিশন এবং প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়ায় গুরুত পরবর্তীতে এই ধরনের মডেল ব্যবহার করা হয়েছিল নির্ধারিত শব্দের প্রবেশের পূর্বে। এছাড়াও, কম্পিউটার ভিশনে ব্যবহৃত কিছু মডেল এনএলপি অ্যাপ্লিকেশনে পরীক্ষা করা হয়নি। In this paper, we compare all these models, first adapting those made in the field of image processing to NLP, and second providing them access to transformers.  তারপর আমরা এই মডেলগুলোকে পরীক্ষা করি যারা একই পরিবর্তনের ভিত্তিক কোডারের সাথে পরীক্ষা করেছি, যারা ক্লাসের বিশাল পরিমাণে পরি আমাদের ফলাফল প্রকাশ করে যে যখন আর্এসসি ডাটাসেটে প্রায় একই ধরনের পদ্ধতি প্রকাশ করে, তখন ইন্টেন্ট ডিটিকেশন কাজের জন্য এটা কেস নয়, যেখানে সম্প্রতি এবং সম্ভবত সেরা প্রতিযোগিতারা  আমরা একই সাথে দেখাচ্ছি যে একটি সাধারণ মেসেলাইন বিস্ময়কর শক্তিশালী। সকল নতুন উন্নয়ন মডেল এবং মূল্যায়নের ফ্রেম প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যায়।', 'fi': 'Nykyaikaiset luokittelumallit kamppailevat, kun merkinnällä varustettujen tietojen määrä on niukka. Ongelman ratkaisemiseksi on syntynyt useita neuraalisia muutaman laukauksen luokitusmalleja, jotka ovat tuottaneet merkittävää edistystä ajan mittaan sekä tietokonenäkö- että luonnollisen kielen prosessoinnissa. Jälkimmäisessä tällaiset mallit luottivat kiinteisiin sanaupotuksiin ennen muuntajien tuloa. Lisäksi joitakin tietokonenäköalalla käytettäviä malleja ei ole vielä testattu NLP-sovelluksissa. Tässä työssä vertaamme kaikkia näitä malleja, ensin mukauttamalla kuvankäsittelyn alalla tehtyjä malleja NLP:hen ja toiseksi tarjoamalla niille pääsyn muuntajiin. Testaamme nämä mallit, jotka on varustettu samalla muuntajapohjaisella kooderilla intent detection -tehtävässä, joka tunnetaan suuresta määrästä luokkia. Tuloksemme osoittavat, että vaikka menetelmät toimivat lähes yhtä hyvin ARSC-aineistossa, näin ei ole Intent Detection -tehtävässä, jossa uusimmat ja oletettavasti parhaat kilpailijat suoriutuvat huonommin kuin vanhemmat ja yksinkertaisemmat kilpailijat (kun taas kaikille annetaan mahdollisuus käyttää muuntajia). Osoitamme myös, että yksinkertainen lähtötilanne on yllättävän vahva. Kaikki uudet kehitetyt mallit ja arviointikehys ovat julkisesti saatavilla.', 'et': 'Kaasaegsed klassifitseerimismudelid kipuvad raskema, kui märgitud andmete hulk on vähe. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks on tekkinud mitmed neuraalsed mõned klassifikatsioonimudelid, mis on andnud aja jooksul märkimisväärseid edusamme nii arvutinägemise kui looduskeele töötlemise valdkonnas. Viimases kasutasid sellised mudelid enne trafode tekkimist fikseeritud sõna manustamist. Lisaks sellele ei ole mõningaid arvutinägemises kasutatavaid mudeleid veel NLP rakendustes testitud. Käesolevas töös võrdleme kõiki neid mudeleid, kohandades esmalt pilditöötluse valdkonnas tehtud mudeleid NLP-ga ja teiseks pakkudes neile juurdepääsu trafodele. Seejärel testime neid sama trafopõhise kodeerijaga varustatud mudeleid kavatsuste tuvastamise ülesandel, mis on tuntud suure hulga klasside poolest. Meie tulemused näitavad, et kuigi meetodid toimivad ARSC andmekogumil peaaegu võrdselt, ei ole see nii kavatsuste tuvastamise ülesande puhul, kus kõige uuemad ja väidetavalt parimad konkurendid on halvemad kui vanemad ja lihtsamad (samas kui kõik saavad ligipääsu trafodele). Samuti näitame, et lihtne lähtealus on üllatavalt tugev. Kõik uued väljatöötatud mudelid ja hindamisraamistik on avalikult kättesaadavad.', 'jv': 'Model sing ngerasasi model modèrn kuwi nggunakake ing dadi nyong pada dadi mbut. text-tool-action Rasané awak-awak dhéwé, model sing nambah cegatané awak dhéwé, ning awak dhéwé transformer. Mungkin, model sing wis nambah nang Kompjuter Vison kuwi durung bisa ujian ing aplikasi NLP. Nang pewiir iki, kita komparasi akeh model iki, sampek perusahaan iso nggawe bagian karo hal-hal nganggo sampek bingi NLP, lan wis segondi iki bakal terus akses karo transformer. Awak dhéwé éntuk model iki dadi, nik akeh operasi layan karo akeh transformer-basa sampek karo awak dhéwé kuwi kesempatan nggawe barang kelas Rejalekan dhéwé mungkin ngertuk ngono hal-hal ngono dataset ARARS iki dadi, iki gak adhil kanggo awak dhéwé nteksi yang cukup, sing paling dhéwé karo perusahaan langkung arah sing luwih apik lan alam sing paling dhéwé (hal sabên bakal terus aléhku bakal terus akeh transformer). Awak dhéwé ngerasakno iki banget dadi apik tenan seneng pisan. Tulung hal-hal model sing gawe nggawe lan keadaan pancen kuwi nggawe publika.', 'sk': 'Sodobni modeli klasifikacije imajo težave, ko je količina označenih podatkov omejena. Da bi premagali to težavo, se je pojavilo več nevronskih modelov klasifikacije nekaj posnetkov, ki so sčasoma prinesli znaten napredek, tako na področju računalniškega vida kot obdelave naravnega jezika. V slednjem so se takšni modeli uporabljali za zanašanje na fiksne vgradnje besed pred prihodom transformatorjev. Poleg tega je treba nekatere modele, ki se uporabljajo v računalniškem vidu, še testirati v aplikacijah NLP. V tem prispevku primerjamo vse te modele, najprej prilagodimo modele, izdelane na področju obdelave slik NLP, drugič pa jim omogočimo dostop do transformatorjev. Nato testiramo te modele, opremljene z istim transformatorskim kodirnikom, pri nalogi zaznavanja namena, znane po velikem številu razredov. Naši rezultati kažejo, da čeprav metode delujejo skoraj enako na naboru podatkov ARSC, to ne velja za nalogo zaznavanja namena, kjer najnovejši in domnevno najboljši konkurenti delujejo slabše od starejših in preprostejših (medtem ko imajo vsi dostop do transformatorjev). Pokazali smo tudi, da je preprosta osnova presenetljivo močna. Vsi novi razviti modeli in okvir ocenjevanja so javno dostopni.', 'ha': "Misãlai na sifilawa na yanzu za'a yi ƙunci a lokacin da aka faɗaɗa data ba da ƙaranci. To, dõmin ya rinjãye wannan masu al'amarin, misãlai masu ƙaranci da tsohon-tsohon neural sun fita, sunã ƙara masu motsi mai girma a lokaci, duk cikin shirin gani na Kwamfyuta da Farawa. Gani na ƙarshe, misãlai za'a yi amfani da shi, a kan ka ci-gabatar da za'a musanya. Da ƙaranci, ba za'a jarraba wasu misãlai da aka yi amfani da cikin shirin nunowa na Compyuta ba don a iya jarraba su a cikin shirin ayukan NLP. Ga wannan takardan, Muke samfani duk waɗannan misãlai, na farkon da za'a sami waɗanda aka samar cikin field da zane ta yi aiki zuwa NLP, da na ƙarami su da za'a sami mutane. Sa'an nan kuma Muke jarraba waɗannan misãlai da ke da kode da ke samu a kan aikin da za'a gane shi, wanda aka sani ana da kuma ma'abun daraja mai girma. MatamayinMu na bayyana cewa, a lokacin da hanyoyinMu ke cika taki daidai a kan tsarin ARSC, wannan bai zama bayan wa aikin Kibaini na Intanet, a lokacin da za'a yi mafi ƙaranci ga tsohon da masu sauri (da aka ba su iya amfani da shigetarwa). Kayya, ko da Muke nũna cewa misalin na sauri ne mai ƙarfi. Dukan misãlai masu motsi da aka buɗe da shi da ƙayyade kimar.", 'bo': 'Modern classification models tend to struggle when the amount of annotated data is scarce. དོན་དག་གནས་ཚུལ་འདི་ལྷག་པར་བྱུང་བར་ན་དབུལ་གྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་རིས་གཞན་ཅིག་མཐོང་ཡོད། དུས་ཚོད་དང་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་མཐོང དམག་མ་འོངས་གྱི་མིག་དཔེ་འདི་དག་གིས་ཕན་ཚུལ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་མཁན་གྱི་སྔོན་དུ་སྟོན་པའི་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས། མ་ཟད། རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་མཐོང་སྣང་ནང་བེད་སྤྱོད་པའི་མིག་དཔེ་ཁོ་ཤས་NLP སྤྱོད་རིས་ནང་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་མིག་སྔོན་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་འདི་ཚོ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གྲ་སྒྲིག་བྱས་པ་ཡིན་ན། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་པ་འདི་དག་གི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་གཅིག་ལས་བཟོ་བཅོས་པ་ལྡན་པའི་ཨིན་ཀོ་ཌར་གཅིག་དང་གཅིག་པུ་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱས ང་ཚོའི་འབྲུག་བྱ་ཚིག་ARSC གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་ནང་དུ་གྲངས་ཀ་འདི་ཁག་ཆེ་གསལ་བཤད་བྱ་རིམ་མེད་དེ། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་བརྟན་པར། གཞི་རྩིས་གཞི་ཞིག་ནི་སྟབས་བདེ་བ་ཡིན་པས། ལྟ་བ་འདི་དག་གི་མཐོང་སྣེ་གསར་བ་བཟོ་བྱས་པའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་དང་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་གཞུང་དེ་མང་ཆོས་ཡོད་པ་རེ', 'he': 'Modern classification models tend to struggle when the amount of annotated data is scarce.  To overcome this issue, several neural few-shot classification models have emerged, yielding significant progress over time, both in Computer Vision and Natural Language Processing.  במקרה האחרון, דוגמנים כאלה נהגו לסמוך על קישור מילים קבועות, לפני ההופעה של משתנים. Additionally, some models used in Computer Vision are yet to be tested in NLP applications.  In this paper, we compare all these models, first adapting those made in the field of image processing to NLP, and second providing them access to transformers.  ואז נבחן את הדוגמנים האלה עם אותו קודד מבוסס על משימה זיהוי הכוונה, ידוע על כמות גדולה של שיעורים. התוצאות שלנו חושפות כי בעוד שיטות מבצעות כמעט באופן שווה על קבוצת נתונים ARSC, זה לא המקרה עבור משימת הבחינה בכוונה, שבו המתחרים הכי לאחרונה והכנראה הטובים ביותר מבצעים גרועים יותר מאותם מבוגרים ופשוטים יותר (בעוד לכולם נותנים גישה לשינויים). אנחנו גם מראים שבסיום פשוט הוא חזק באופן מפתיע. כל הדוגמנים המפותחים החדשים, כמו גם מסגרת הערכה, הופכים לפומבי.'}
{'en': 'Multilingual Machine Translation : Closing the Gap between Shared and Language-specific Encoder-Decoders', 'ar': 'الترجمة الآلية متعددة اللغات: سد الفجوة بين وحدات فك التشفير المشتركة واللغة الخاصة', 'es': 'Traducción automática multilingüe: cerrar la brecha entre codificadores y decodificadores compartidos y específicos del idioma', 'pt': 'Tradução automática multilíngue: fechando a lacuna entre codificadores-decodificadores compartilhados e específicos de idioma', 'fr': 'Traduction automatique multilingue\xa0: Combler le fossé entre les encodeurs-décodeurs partagés et spécifiques à une langue', 'ja': '多言語機械翻訳：共有エンコーダと言語固有エンコーダデコーダのギャップを埋める', 'zh': '多言机器翻译:缩小共编码器与特定语编码器解码器相去', 'hi': 'बहुभाषी मशीन अनुवाद: साझा और भाषा-विशिष्ट एन्कोडर-डिकोडर के बीच अंतर को बंद करना', 'ru': 'Многоязычный машинный перевод: устранение разрыва между общими и языковыми кодерами-декодерами', 'ga': 'Aistriúchán Meaisín Ilteangach: Dúnadh an Bhearna idir Ionchódóirí Roinnte agus Ionchódóirí Teanga-Shonracha', 'el': 'Πολυγλωσσική μηχανική μετάφραση: Κλείσιμο του χάσματος μεταξύ κοινόχρηστων και γλωσσικών κωδικοποιητών-αποκωδικοποιητών', 'ka': 'მრავალენგური მაქსინის განსაგულისხმები: გადახურება განსაზღვრებული და ენათის განსაზღვრებული კოდირების განსაზღვრებით', 'hu': 'Többnyelvű gépi fordítás: A megosztott és nyelvspecifikus kódoló-dekódolók közötti szakadék megszüntetése', 'it': 'Traduzione automatica multilingue: colmare il divario tra codificatori condivisi e specifici per la lingua', 'kk': 'Көп тілді машинаның аударуы: Ортақталған және тіл ерекше кодерлердің арасындағы аралығын жабу', 'lt': 'Daugiakalbis mašinų vertimas: skirtumo tarp bendrų ir konkrečiai kalbai skirtų koduotojų uždarymas', 'mk': 'Multilingual Machine Translation: Closing the Gap between Shared and Language-specific Encoder-Decoders', 'ml': 'പല ഭാഷ മെഷിന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു: പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനും ഭാഷ- പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിട്ടുള്ള എക്കോഡെര്\u200d ഡ', 'mt': 'Traduzzjoni Multilingwi tal-Magna: L-għeluq tal-Gap bejn Kodifikaturi Kondiviżi u Speċifiċi għal-Lingwa', 'ms': 'Terjemahan Mesin Berbahasa: Tutup Gap diantara Pengekod-Pengenkod Berkongsi dan Spesifik Bahasa', 'mn': 'Олон хэл машины хөрөнгө оруулалт: Холбоотой болон Холбоотой Коддогчийн хоорондын газар холбоотой', 'no': 'Fleirspråk maskinsomsetjing: Lukk mellom delte og språk- spesifikke kodar', 'pl': 'Wielojęzyczne tłumaczenie maszynowe: zamykanie luki między współdzielonymi i specyficznymi dla języka koderami', 'sr': 'Multijezički prevod mašine: zatvaranje rasporeda između dijeljenih i jezičkih kodera', 'ro': 'Traducere automată multilingvă: închiderea decalajului dintre decodoarele de codare partajate și specifice limbii', 'so': 'Turjumista mashiinka luuqadaha badan: Closing the Gap between Shared and Specific Encoder-Decoders', 'ta': 'பல மொழி இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு: பங்கிடப்பட்ட மற்றும் மொழி', 'sv': 'Flerspråkig maskinöversättning: Stänga gapet mellan delade och språkspecifika kodare', 'ur': 'Multilingual Machine Translation: The Gap between Shared and Language-specific Encoders-Decoders', 'si': 'ගොඩක් භාෂාභාෂාවික මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය: සමාගත සහ භාෂාව- විශේෂ සංකේතකය- ඩිකෝඩර් අතර', 'vi': 'Dịch đa ngôn ngữ: Đóng các lỗ hổng cho tàu ngầm chia sẻ và Ngôn ngữ', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Многоезичен машинен превод: Затваряне на разликата между споделени и специфични за езика кодери-декодери', 'hr': 'Mnogjezički prevod uređaja: zatvaranje rasporeda između dijeljenih i jezičkih kodera', 'nl': 'Meertalige machinevertaling: het dichten van de kloof tussen gedeelde en taalspecifieke encoder-decoders', 'da': 'Flersproget maskinoversættelse: Lukning af kløften mellem delte og sprogspecifikke koder-dekodere', 'id': 'Translation Multilingual Machine: Menutup Gap antara Shared dan Spesifik-Language Encoder-Decoder', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین\u200cهای زیادی زبان: بستن پیوند بین رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cهای مشترک و زبان', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Mashine ya lugha mbalimbali: Kufunga Gazeti kati ya Kushirikishwa na Lugha', 'tr': 'Çoklu dilli Maşynyň Terjime: Paýlaşmaly we Dil Aýratyn Ködler', 'af': 'Multilingual Masjien Vertaling: Sluit die Gap tussen Gedeelde en Taal- Spesifieke Koder- Dekoders', 'sq': 'Përkthimi shumëgjuhës i makinës: Mbyllja e mungesës midis koduesve të ndarë dhe specifikë gjuhës', 'de': 'Mehrsprachige maschinelle Übersetzung: Schließen der Lücke zwischen gemeinsamen und sprachspezifischen Encoder-Decodern', 'ko': '다중 언어 번역: 공유와 특정 언어 인코더 - 디코더 사이의 격차 줄이기', 'am': 'መግለጫ', 'hy': 'Բազլեզու մեքենայի թարգմանություն. Բազմալեզու և լեզվին հատուկ կոդերների միջև գոյություն ունեցող տարբերությունը փակելը', 'bn': 'বহুভাষী মেশিন অনুবাদ: শেয়ার করা এবং ভাষা বিশেষ এনকোডার- ডিকোডারের মধ্যে গ্যাপ বন্ধ করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Mnogjezički prevod uređaja: zatvaranje rasporeda između dijeljenih i jezičkih kodera', 'ca': 'Traducció multilingüe de màquines: Fer la diferència entre codificadors compartits i específics per llenguatge', 'cs': 'Vícejazyčný strojový překlad: uzavření mezery mezi sdílenými a jazykovými dekodéry', 'et': 'Mitmekeelne masintõlge: jagatud ja keelespetsiifiliste kodeerijate vahelise lõhe sulgemine', 'az': "Çoxlu dil Makinelərin Çeviri: Paylaşılmış və Dil müəyyən Kodlayıcıları arasındakı Gap'i Qapat", 'fi': 'Monikielinen konekäännös: Jaettujen ja kielikohtaisten koodaajien välisen kuilun sulkeminen', 'jv': 'Multi-Linguir Manual Tarjamahan', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'תרגום מכונות רבות שפות: סגור את הפער בין קודנים משותפים לשפה ומסופרים לשפה', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་དབྱེ་བ་བཟོ་བྱེད་མི་འདུག：མཉམ་སྤྱོད་དང་སྐད་ཡིག་ཁྱད་པར་དབྱེ་བ་དང་ཁ་བསྡམས་པ', 'sk': 'Večjezični strojni prevod: zapiranje vrzeli med kodirnimi dekodirji v skupni rabi in jezikovno specifičnimi kodirniki'}
{'en': 'State-of-the-art multilingual machine translation relies on a universal encoder-decoder, which requires retraining the entire system to add new languages. In this paper, we propose an alternative approach that is based on language-specific encoder-decoders, and can thus be more easily extended to new languages by learning their corresponding modules. So as to encourage a common interlingua representation, we simultaneously train the N initial languages. Our experiments show that the proposed approach outperforms the universal encoder-decoder by 3.28 BLEU points on average, while allowing to add new languages without the need to retrain the rest of the modules. All in all, our work closes the gap between shared and language-specific encoderdecoders, advancing toward modular multilingual machine translation systems that can be flexibly extended in lifelong learning settings.', 'ar': 'تعتمد الترجمة الآلية متعددة اللغات الحديثة على وحدة فك ترميز عالمية ، الأمر الذي يتطلب إعادة تدريب النظام بأكمله لإضافة لغات جديدة. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نهجًا بديلًا يعتمد على وحدات فك التشفير الخاصة بلغة معينة ، وبالتالي يمكن توسيعه بسهولة ليشمل لغات جديدة من خلال تعلم الوحدات النمطية المقابلة لها. من أجل تشجيع تمثيل interlingua مشترك ، نقوم في نفس الوقت بتدريب اللغات الأولية N. تُظهر تجاربنا أن النهج المقترح يتفوق على وحدة فك التشفير العالمية بمقدار 3.28 نقطة BLEU في المتوسط ، مع السماح بإضافة لغات جديدة دون الحاجة إلى إعادة تدريب بقية الوحدات. بشكل عام ، يعمل عملنا على سد الفجوة بين أجهزة فك التشفير المشتركة والخاصة باللغة ، والتقدم نحو أنظمة الترجمة الآلية متعددة اللغات التي يمكن توسيعها بمرونة في إعدادات التعلم مدى الحياة.', 'es': 'La traducción automática multilingüe de última generación se basa en un codificador-decodificador universal, que requiere volver a entrenar a todo el sistema para añadir nuevos idiomas. En este artículo, proponemos un enfoque alternativo que se basa en codificadores-decodificadores específicos del idioma y, por lo tanto, se puede extender más fácilmente a nuevos idiomas mediante el aprendizaje de sus módulos correspondientes. Para fomentar una representación interlingüística común, entrenamos simultáneamente los N idiomas iniciales. Nuestros experimentos muestran que el enfoque propuesto supera al codificador-decodificador universal en 3,28 puntos BLEU de media, al tiempo que permite añadir nuevos idiomas sin necesidad de volver a entrenar al resto de los módulos. Con todo, nuestro trabajo cierra la brecha entre los codificadores/decodificadores compartidos y los específicos del idioma, avanzando hacia sistemas modulares de traducción automática multilingüe que pueden ampliarse de manera flexible en entornos de aprendizaje permanente.', 'fr': "La traduction automatique multilingue de pointe repose sur un encodeur-décodeur universel, ce qui nécessite de réentraîner l'ensemble du système pour ajouter de nouvelles langues. Dans cet article, nous proposons une approche alternative basée sur des encodeurs-décodeurs spécifiques au langage, et pouvant ainsi être étendue plus facilement à de nouvelles langues en apprenant leurs modules correspondants. Afin de favoriser une représentation interlingua commune, nous formons simultanément les N langues initiales. Nos expériences montrent que l'approche proposée surpasse l'encodeur-décodeur universel de 3,28 points BLEU en moyenne, tout en permettant d'ajouter de nouvelles langues sans avoir à recycler le reste des modules. Dans l'ensemble, notre travail comble le fossé entre les encodeurs/décodeurs partagés et spécifiques à la langue, en progressant vers des systèmes de traduction automatique multilingues modulaires qui peuvent être étendus de manière flexible dans les environnements d'apprentissage tout au long de la vie.", 'pt': 'A tradução automática multilíngue de última geração depende de um codificador-decodificador universal, o que requer o retreinamento de todo o sistema para adicionar novos idiomas. Neste artigo, propomos uma abordagem alternativa que é baseada em codificadores-decodificadores específicos da linguagem e, portanto, pode ser mais facilmente estendida a novas linguagens aprendendo seus módulos correspondentes. Para incentivar uma representação interlíngua comum, treinamos simultaneamente as N línguas iniciais. Nossos experimentos mostram que a abordagem proposta supera o codificador-decodificador universal em 3,28 pontos BLEU em média, permitindo adicionar novas linguagens sem a necessidade de retreinar o restante dos módulos. Em suma, nosso trabalho fecha a lacuna entre codificadores decodificadores compartilhados e específicos de idioma, avançando em direção a sistemas modulares de tradução automática multilíngue que podem ser estendidos de forma flexível em configurações de aprendizado ao longo da vida.', 'ja': '最先端の多言語機械翻訳は、ユニバーサルエンコーダーデコーダーに依存しており、新しい言語を追加するためにシステム全体を再訓練する必要があります。本稿では、言語固有のエンコーダデコーダに基づいた代替アプローチを提案し、対応するモジュールを学習することで、より簡単に新しい言語に拡張することができる。共通の言語間表現を奨励するために、私たちは同時にN個の初期言語を訓練します。私たちの実験では、提案されたアプローチは、ユニバーサルエンコーダーデコーダーを平均3.28 BLEUポイント上回り、他のモジュールを再トレーニングすることなく新しい言語を追加できることが示されています。総じて、私たちの仕事は、共有と言語固有のエンコーダーデコーダー間のギャップを埋め、生涯学習の場で柔軟に拡張できるモジュール式多言語機械翻訳システムに向かって進んでいます。', 'hi': 'अत्याधुनिक बहुभाषी मशीन अनुवाद एक सार्वभौमिक एन्कोडर-डिकोडर पर निर्भर करता है, जिसके लिए नई भाषाओं को जोड़ने के लिए पूरे सिस्टम को फिर से प्रशिक्षित करने की आवश्यकता होती है। इस पेपर में, हम एक वैकल्पिक दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो भाषा-विशिष्ट एन्कोडर-डिकोडर पर आधारित है, और इस प्रकार उनके संबंधित मॉड्यूल को सीखकर नई भाषाओं में अधिक आसानी से विस्तारित किया जा सकता है। ताकि एक आम इंटरलिंगुआ प्रतिनिधित्व को प्रोत्साहित किया जा सके, हम एक साथ एन प्रारंभिक भाषाओं को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण सार्वभौमिक एन्कोडर-डिकोडर को औसतन 3.28 BLEU अंकों से बेहतर बनाता है, जबकि बाकी मॉड्यूल को फिर से प्रशिक्षित करने की आवश्यकता के बिना नई भाषाओं को जोड़ने की अनुमति देता है। कुल मिलाकर, हमारा काम साझा और भाषा-विशिष्ट एनकोडेडकोडर्स के बीच की खाई को बंद कर देता है, मॉड्यूलर बहुभाषी मशीन अनुवाद प्रणालियों की ओर बढ़ता है जिसे आजीवन सीखने की सेटिंग्स में लचीला रूप से बढ़ाया जा सकता है।', 'zh': '最先进者多言机器翻译赖通用编码器解码器,须更练全统以添新语。 本文之中,特定言编码器解码器代,故可以学其模块益疏至新语。 为劝同跨语,同时N种初。 臣等实验明,所言均出编码器解码器3.28 BLEU点,并许添新语而不复练其余模块。 总而言之,吾事缩而共编码器,与特定言编码器相去,向模块化多言机器翻译统,可以终身学广矣。', 'ru': 'Современный многоязычный машинный перевод основан на универсальном кодере-декодере, который требует переподготовки всей системы для добавления новых языков. В этой статье мы предлагаем альтернативный подход, который основан на конкретных языковых кодерах-декодерах и, таким образом, может быть более легко распространен на новые языки, изучая их соответствующие модули. Чтобы стимулировать общее межъязыковое представление, мы одновременно обучаем N исходных языков. Наши эксперименты показывают, что предлагаемый подход превосходит универсальный кодер-декодер в среднем на 3,28 балла BLEU, при этом позволяя добавлять новые языки без необходимости переобучения остальных модулей. В целом, наша работа сокращает разрыв между общими и специфическими для языка декодерами, продвигаясь к модульным многоязычным системам машинного перевода, которые могут быть гибко расширены в условиях обучения на протяжении всей жизни.', 'ga': 'Braitheann an t-aistriúchán meaisín ilteangach úrscothach ar ionchódóir-códaitheoir uilíoch, rud a éilíonn athoiliúint a chur ar an gcóras iomlán chun teangacha nua a chur leis. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid cur chuige eile atá bunaithe ar ionchódóirí a bhaineann go sonrach le teanga, agus ar féidir é a leathnú go teangacha nua ar bhealach níos éasca trí na modúil chomhfhreagracha a fhoghlaim. Chun léiriú comónta idirteanga a spreagadh, cuirimid oiliúint ar na teangacha tosaigh N ag an am céanna. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh go n-éiríonn leis an gcur chuige atá beartaithe ná an t-ionchódóir-códaitheoir uilíoch 3.28 pointe BLEU ar an meán, agus ceadaítear teangacha nua a chur leis gan gá leis an gcuid eile de na modúil a athoiliúint. Tríd is tríd, dúnann ár gcuid oibre an bhearna idir ionchódóirí comhroinnte agus ionchódóirí a bhaineann go sonrach le teanga, ag dul ar aghaidh i dtreo córais mhodúla ilteangacha aistriúcháin mheaisín ar féidir iad a leathnú go solúbtha i suíomhanna foghlama ar feadh an tsaoil.', 'el': 'Η υπερσύγχρονη πολυγλωσσική μηχανική μετάφραση βασίζεται σε έναν καθολικό κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή, ο οποίος απαιτεί επανεκπαίδευση ολόκληρου του συστήματος για την προσθήκη νέων γλωσσών. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια εναλλακτική προσέγγιση που βασίζεται σε κωδικοποιητές-αποκωδικοποιητές-κωδικοποιητές-ειδικά για τη γλώσσα, και έτσι μπορεί να επεκταθεί ευκολότερα σε νέες γλώσσες μαθαίνοντας τις αντίστοιχες ενότητες τους. Για να ενθαρρυνθεί μια κοινή διασγγαλική εκπροσώπηση, εκπαιδεύουμε ταυτόχρονα τις αρχικές γλώσσες Ν. Τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση ξεπερνά τον καθολικό κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή κατά μέσο όρο κατά 3.28 σημεία ενώ επιτρέπει την προσθήκη νέων γλωσσών χωρίς την ανάγκη επανακατάρτισης των υπόλοιπων μονάδων. Συνολικά, η εργασία μας κλείνει το χάσμα μεταξύ κοινών και γλωσσικών κωδικοποιητών, προχωρώντας προς μορφωματικά πολυγλωσσικά συστήματα μηχανικής μετάφρασης που μπορούν να επεκταθούν ευέλικτα σε περιβάλλοντα διά βίου μάθησης.', 'hu': 'A legkorszerűbb többnyelvű gépi fordítás egy univerzális kódoló-dekódolóra épül, amely az egész rendszer átképzését igényli új nyelvek hozzáadásához. Ebben a tanulmányban egy alternatív megközelítést javasolunk, amely nyelvspecifikus kódoló-dekódereken alapul, és így könnyebben kiterjeszthető az új nyelvekre a megfelelő modulok elsajátításával. Annak érdekében, hogy ösztönözzük a közös interlingua reprezentációt, egyidejűleg képezzük az N nyelveket. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt megközelítés átlagosan 3,28 BLEU ponttal felülmúlja az univerzális kódoló-dekódolót, miközben lehetővé teszi új nyelvek hozzáadását anélkül, hogy a modulok többi részét át kellene tanítani. Összességében munkánk megszünteti a megosztott és nyelvspecifikus kódolók közötti szakadékot, előrelépve a moduláris többnyelvű gépi fordítási rendszerek felé, amelyek rugalmasan bővíthetők az egész életen át tartó tanulási környezetben.', 'ka': 'მულტილური მანქანის გადაწყვეტილება უნივერსალური კოდირების გამოყენებაზე დაახლოდება, რომელიც უნდა ყველა სისტემის გადაწყვეტილება ახალი ენების დამატებისთვის. ამ წიგნიში ჩვენ დავიწყებთ ალტენტრუმენტური პროგრამა, რომელიც ენათების სპექტიფიკური კოდერების დაბაზეულია, და ამიტომ შეიძლება უფრო ადვილედ ახალ ენათზე გავიწყება ამიტომ, როგორც ერთადერთი ინტერლენგური გამოსახულებლად, ჩვენ ერთადერთად N-ის დასახულებლად განვიწყებთ. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები აჩვენებს, რომ მინდა გავაკეთოთ სამუშაო სამუშაო ბლესო წერტილებით სამუშაო სამუშაო ინფორესოფორესოფორესოფორესოფორესოფორმაციის გა ყველაფერი, ჩვენი სამუშაო დახურება განსხვავება საერთო და ენის სპეციფიკალური კოდექტორების განსხვავებაში, რომელიც მოდულური მრავალური სისტემის განსხვავება, რომელიც შეიძლება ძალიან გან', 'it': "La traduzione automatica multilingue all'avanguardia si basa su un encoder-decoder universale, che richiede una riqualificazione dell'intero sistema per aggiungere nuove lingue. In questo articolo, proponiamo un approccio alternativo che si basa su encoder-decoder specifici per la lingua, e può quindi essere più facilmente esteso a nuove lingue imparando i moduli corrispondenti. Per incoraggiare una rappresentazione interlinguistica comune, addestriamo contemporaneamente le N lingue iniziali. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano che l'approccio proposto supera l'encoder-decoder universale in media di 3,28 punti BLEU, consentendo di aggiungere nuovi linguaggi senza la necessità di riqualificare il resto dei moduli. Nel complesso, il nostro lavoro colma il divario tra codificatori condivisi e specifici per la lingua, avanzando verso sistemi modulari di traduzione automatica multilingue che possono essere estesi in modo flessibile in contesti di apprendimento permanente.", 'kk': 'Бірнеше тілдерді қосу үшін жүйеңіздің күйін қайта жеткізу керек. Бұл қағазда, тілдердің ерекше кодерлеріне негізделген альтернативті тәсілді жұмыс істейміз. Сондай-ақ олардың сәйкес модульдерін оқып жаңа тілдерге оңай келтіруге болады. Осылайша, жалпы интерлингвиялық түсініктерді көмектесу үшін бір-біріміз N бастапқы тілдерді оқыту үшін. Біздің тәжірибеміздің ұсынысы 3,28 BLEU нүктелерімен әлемдік кодтамасын орташа декодтамасыз жеткізеді дегенді көрсетеді. Бірақ басқа модульдерді қайта алу керек болмаса, жаңа тілдерді қосуға мүмкінд Барлығында, жұмыс істегеніміз ортақ және тілдердің ерекше кодердегіштерінің арасындағы аралығын жабылады. Бұл модульдердің бірнеше тілдердің аудару жүйелеріне көп тілдердің аудару жүйелеріне қарай жаса', 'mk': 'Стандардно мултијазичен машински превод зависи од универзален кодер-декодер, кој бара ретренирање на целиот систем за додавање нови јазици. Во овој документ, предложуваме алтернативен пристап кој е базиран на јазички специфични кодери, и со тоа може да биде полесно проширен на нови јазици со учење на нивните соодветни модули. За да охрабриме заедничко меѓујазичко претставување, истовремено ги обучуваме почетните јазици на Н. Нашите експерименти покажуваат дека предложениот пристап го надминува универзалниот кодер-декодер за 3,28 поени во просек, додека овозможува додавање на нови јазици без потреба од ретренирање на остатокот од модулите. Нашата работа ја затвора празнината помеѓу заедничките и јазичните кодери, напредувајќи кон модуларните мултијазични машински преведувачки системи кои можат да бидат флексибилно продолжени во условите за животно учење.', 'lt': 'Naujausiausias daugiakalbis mašinų vertimas grindžiamas universaliu kodavimo dekoderiu, kuris reikalauja pertvarkyti visą sistemą, kad būtų pridėtos naujos kalbos. Šiame dokumente siūlome alternatyvų metodą, pagrįstą konkrečiai kalbai būdingais kodatoriais, todėl jį galima lengviau išplėsti ir taikyti naujoms kalboms, mokant atitinkamus modulius. Kad būtų skatinamas bendras tarpkalbinis atstovavimas, kartu mokome N pradines kalbas. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad siūlomas metodas viršija universal ų kodavimo kodą vidutiniškai 3,28 BLEU taško, tačiau leidžia pridėti naujų kalbų nereikalaujant persvarstyti likusių modulių. Apskritai, mūsų darbas užbaigia skirtumą tarp bendrų ir kalboms skirtų kodavimo kodų ir siekia modulių daugiakalbių mašin ų vertimo sistemų, kurias galima lanksčiai išplėsti mokymosi visą gyvenimą aplinkoje.', 'ml': 'പുതിയ ഭാഷകള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d സിസ്റ്റം മുഴുവന്\u200d സിസ്റ്റം വീണ്ടും ചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഭാഷ-പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിട്ടുള്ള കോഡോര്\u200dഡുകള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ മറ്റൊരു വഴിയില്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട് അവരു അതുകൊണ്ട് ഒരു സാധാരണ ഇന്റര്\u200dലിങ്കാ പ്രതിനിധിയെ ആശ്വാസപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരേ സമയത്ത് N ആദ്യ ഭാഷകളെ പരിശീല നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട സാധാരണ 3.28 ബിലിയു പോയിന്\u200dറില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സാധാരണ ക എല്ലായിടത്തും നമ്മുടെ ജോലി പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതും ഭാഷ-പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിട്ടുള്ള കോഡെകോഡുകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d അടച്ചുനിര്\u200dത്തുന്നു.', 'mn': 'Урлагийн олон хэлний машин хөрөнгө оруулалт нь шинэ хэл нэмэхэд бүх системийг дахин авах шаардлагатай универсал коддогч дээр байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэлний тодорхой коддогч дээр суурилсан өөр нэг арга зам зааж өгдөг. Иймээс тэдний холбоотой модульуудыг суралцаж шинэ хэл руу илүү амархан нэмэгдүүлж болно. Тэгэхээр нийтлэг интерлингийн үзүүлэлтийг дэмжихийн тулд бид Н эхний хэл дээр ажилладаг. Бидний туршилтууд санал өгсөн арга нь бусад модульуудыг авах шаардлагагүйгээр шинэ хэл нэмэх боломжтой болно. Ихэнхдээ бидний ажил хуваалцах болон хэл тодорхой коддогчийн хоорондын ялгааг хадгалдаг. Мөн хэл хэлний олон хэлний хөгжүүлэх системүүдэд урт хугацааны суралцах боломжтой болно.', 'no': 'Fleirspråksomsetjing av multispråksmaskina er avhengig av ein universell koder, som krev å henta heile systemet til å leggja til nye språk. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein alternativ tilnærming som er basert på språkspesifiserte koderingskodingar, og derfor kan det vere lettere utvida til nye språk ved å lære dei tilsvarande modulane. Så for å oppfordre eit felles interlingua-representasjon, treng vi samtidig N-oppstartspråk. Eksperimentane våre viser at den foreslåde tilnærminga utfører den universele koderingskoderinga med 3,28 BLEU-punkt gjennomsnittlig, mens det tillater å leggja til nye språk utan nødvendighet for å gjenoppretta resten av modulane. I alt, arbeidet vårt lukkar avstanden mellom delte og språkspesifiserte koderingskodingar, og framfører mot modular fleirspråksomsetjingssystemer som kan fleksibelt utvidast i læringsinnstillingar for livsgreng.', 'pl': 'Najnowocześniejsze wielojęzyczne tłumaczenie maszynowe opiera się na uniwersalnym koderze-dekoderze, co wymaga przeszkolenia całego systemu w celu dodania nowych języków. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy alternatywne podejście, które opiera się na specyficznych dla języka koderów-dekoderach, a tym samym może być łatwiej rozszerzone na nowe języki poprzez naukę odpowiednich modułów. Aby zachęcić do wspólnej reprezentacji międzywojęzykowej, jednocześnie trenujemy języki początkowe N. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że proponowane podejście przewyższa uniwersalny koder-dekoder średnio o punkty 3.28 BLEU, pozwalając jednocześnie dodawać nowe języki bez konieczności przeszkolenia reszty modułów. Ogólnie rzecz biorąc, nasza praca zamyka lukę między wspólnymi i specyficznymi koderami koderów językowych, postępując w kierunku modułowych wielojęzycznych systemów tłumaczenia maszynowego, które mogą być elastycznie rozszerzane w ramach uczenia się przez całe życie.', 'ro': 'Traducerea automată multilingvă de ultimă oră se bazează pe un encoder-decoder universal, care necesită recalificarea întregului sistem pentru a adăuga noi limbi. În această lucrare, propunem o abordare alternativă care se bazează pe encoder-decodere specifice limbii și care poate fi astfel extinsă mai ușor la noi limbi prin învățarea modulelor corespunzătoare. Pentru a încuraja o reprezentare interlingvă comună, pregătim simultan N limbi inițiale. Experimentele noastre arată că abordarea propusă depășește codorul universal-decodor cu 3,28 puncte BLEU în medie, permițând în același timp adăugarea de noi limbi fără a fi nevoie să recalifice restul modulelor. În ansamblu, activitatea noastră elimină decalajul dintre codificatorii partajaţi şi cei specifici limbii, avansând spre sisteme modulare de traducere automată multilingvă care pot fi extinse flexibil în cadrul învăţării pe tot parcursul vieţii.', 'ms': 'State-of-the-art multilingual machine translation relies on a universal encoder-decoder, which requires retraining the entire system to add new languages.  Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan pendekatan alternatif yang berdasarkan pengekod-pengekod-spesifik bahasa, dan dengan itu boleh lebih mudah dilangkah ke bahasa baru dengan mempelajari modul yang sesuai. Jadi untuk mendorong perwakilan antara bahasa, kita secara bersamaan melatih bahasa awal N. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan yang direncanakan melampaui pengekod-universal dengan 3.28 titik BLEU secara rata-rata, sementara membenarkan menambah bahasa baru tanpa perlukan untuk melatih semula modul yang lain. Semuanya, kerja kita menutup ruang antara pengekod kongsi dan bahasa-spesifik, maju ke sistem terjemahan mesin berbilang bahasa modular yang boleh dilambangkan secara fleksibel dalam tetapan belajar sepanjang hidup.', 'sr': 'Državni multijezički prevod uređaja oslanja se na univerzalni koder-dekoder, koji zahteva povratak cijelog sistema da doda nove jezike. U ovom papiru predlažemo alternativni pristup koji je baziran na jezičkim koderima specifičnim koderima, i stoga se može lako proširiti na nove jezike učeći njihove odgovarajuće module. Da bismo ohrabrili zajedničku interlingujsku predstavu, trenirali smo početne jezike N. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da predloženi pristup iznosi univerzalni koder-dekoder u prosjeku 3,28 BLEU bodova, dok omogućava dodati nove jezike bez potrebe da povrati ostatak modula. U svemu, naš rad zatvara prazninu između dijeljenih i specifičnih kodera jezika, napredujući prema modularnim multijezičkim sistemima prevođenja mašina koji mogu biti fleksibilno prošireni u životnim nastavama učenja.', 'mt': 'It-traduzzjoni multilingwi bil-magna l-aktar avvanzata tiddependi fuq dekoder universali tal-kodiċi, li jeħtieġ it-taħriġ mill-ġdid tas-sistema kollha biex jiżdiedu lingwi ġodda. In this paper, we propose an alternative approach that is based on language-specific encoder-decoders, and can thus be more easily extended to new languages by learning their corresponding modules.  So as to encourage a common interlingua representation, we simultaneously train the N initial languages.  L-esperimenti tagħna juru li l-approċċ propost jaqbeż il-kodiċi universali b’medja ta’ 3.28 punt BLEU, filwaqt li jippermetti li jiżdiedu lingwi ġodda mingħajr il-ħtieġa li jerġgħu jitħarrġu l-bqija tal-moduli. Kollox ma’ kollox, ix-xogħol tagħna jagħlaq id-distakk bejn kodifikaturi kondiviżi u speċifiċi għall-lingwi, billi nimxu ’l quddiem lejn sistemi modulari multilingwi ta’ traduzzjoni tal-magni li jistgħu jiġu estiżi b’mod flessibbli f’ambjenti ta’ tagħlim tul il-ħajja.', 'si': 'මුළු භාෂාවක් භාෂාවක් භාෂාවක් භාෂාවක් පරිවර්තනයක් සාමාන්\u200dය සංකේතකයෙන් විශ්වාස කරනවා, ඒකෙන් අළ මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා වෙනස් භාෂාවක් විශේෂ කරුණාකරුවක් වලට අධාරිත වෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ඒ වගේම අලුත් භාෂ ඉතින් සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරන්න, අපි සමහරවිට N පළමු භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරනවා. අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම සංවිධාන කෝඩර් ඩිකෝඩර් 3.28 බ්ලූස් පින්තුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරිය හැම දෙයක්ම, අපේ වැඩේ සාමාන්\u200dය සහ භාෂා විශේෂ සංකේතකයෙන් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, මොඩ්යුලර් විශේෂ භාෂාවක් පද්ධතියෙන් අවධ', 'so': 'Turjumista mashiinka luuqadaha badan oo dowladda farshaxanka ah waxay ku xiran tahay mid ku qoran qorshaha kodeynta caalamiga ah, kaas oo u baahan in la cusboonaysiiyo nidaamka oo dhan si ay ku daro luuqadaha cusub. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa qaab kale oo ku saleysan qoraalka codsiga ee luuqada cayiman, sidaas darteed waxaa si fudud looga sii wadi karo luuqadaha cusub si aad u barato noocyadooda ku habboon. Si aan ugu dhiirrigelino wakiilka luqada caadiga ah, isla markaasna waxaynu ku tababarinnaa luqada koowaad ee N. Imtixaankayada ayaa muuqanaya in qaababka la soo jeeday ay ay ku soo bandhigaan barxada caalamiga ah oo ku qoran 3.28 BLEU goor, isla markaasna ay u oggolayso in lagu daro luuqado cusub oo aan u baahnayn in qalabka kale dib loo celiyo. Dhammaan, shaqadayadu wuxuu xidhaa burburka kala duduwan oo kala duduwan luqadaha, waxaana horumarinaya nidaamka tarjumaadda machadka kala duduwan oo la kordhi karo xilliga barbaarinta nololeed.', 'ta': 'State-of-the-art multilingual machine translation relies on a universal encoder-decoder, which requires retraining the entire system to add new languages.  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் மொழி- குறிப்பிட்ட குறியீட்டு குறியீடுகளை அடிப்படையில் அடிப்படையான மாற்று செயல்பாட்டை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோ ஒரு பொதுவான மொழிக்குவின் குறிப்பிடுதலை ஆரம்பிக்க, நாம் ஒன்றாக N மொழிகளை பயிற்சி செய்கிறோம். எங்கள் பரிந்துரைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட செயல்பாடுகள் 3. 28 பிலியு புள்ளிகளால் பொதுவான குறியீட்டு குறியீட்டை செயல்படுத்துகிறது என்பதை காட்டுகிறது, மற எல்லாவற்றிலும், எங்கள் வேலை பகிர்ந்து மற்றும் மொழி- குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறியீட்டாளர்களுக்கிடையே இடைவெளியை மூடுகிறது, மூலக்கூறு மொழ', 'ur': 'ملتی زبان کے ملتی زبان مشین کی ترجمہ ایک یونلوسٹ کوڈر-ڈیکوڈر پر اعتماد ہے، جسے تمام سیسٹم کو نوی زبانوں میں اضافہ کرنے کے لئے ضرورت ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک الٹی طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو زبان کے مطابق کوڈر-ڈکوڈر پر بنی جاتی ہے، اور اس طرح ان کے مطابق موڈولوں کی تعلیم کے ذریعہ نوی زبانوں میں آسان تر پھیلائی جاتی ہے۔ تو ہم ایک مشترک interlingua representation کی تدبیر کریں گے، ہم ایک دفعہ N کی آغاز زبانوں کی تدبیر کریں گے۔ ہمارے آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی تقریبا 3.28 بلیوس پوینٹوں کے ذریعہ عمومیہ سے عمومیہ انکوڈر ڈکوڈر کو اضافہ کرتا ہے اور باقی موڈلوں کو دوبارہ پیدا کرنے کی ضرورت کے بغیر نوی زبانیں اضافہ کرنا اجازت دیتا ہے۔ ہمارا کام مشترک اور زبان کے مطابق کوڈر ڈکوڈر کے درمیان تفاوت بند کر رہا ہے، جو موڈولر multilingual machine translation systems کی طرف چلتی ہے جو زندگی کی تعلیم سیٹیوں میں اضافہ کر سکتی ہے۔', 'sv': 'Den senaste flerspråkiga maskinöversättningen bygger på en universell kodavkodare som kräver omskolning av hela systemet för att lägga till nya språk. I denna uppsats föreslår vi ett alternativt tillvägagångssätt som bygger på språkspecifika encoder-dekodrar och därmed lättare kan utvidgas till nya språk genom att lära sig motsvarande moduler. För att uppmuntra en gemensam interspråkig representation tränar vi samtidigt N initialspråken. Våra experiment visar att det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet överträffar den universella encoder-avkodaren med 3,28 BLEU-punkter i genomsnitt, samtidigt som det tillåter att lägga till nya språk utan att behöva omskola resten av modulerna. Sammantaget minskar vårt arbete klyftan mellan delade och språkspecifika kodare och går vidare mot modulära flerspråkiga maskinöversättningssystem som flexibelt kan utökas i livslångt lärande.', 'vi': 'Bản dịch phát ngôn ngữ đa dạng tuyệt vời nhờ một bộ mã hóa phổ biến, yêu cầu phải tái tạo lại to àn bộ hệ thống để thêm ngôn ngữ mới. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp thay đổi dựa trên các bộ mã hóa đặc trưng ngôn ngữ, và có thể dễ dàng mở rộng cho các ngôn ngữ mới bằng cách học các mô-đun tương ứng. Để thúc đẩy sự sắp xếp lại liên tục, chúng ta sẽ cùng nhau huấn luyện ngôn ngữ gốc N. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy phương pháp này thực hiện việc giải mã đa số. trong tính trung bình 3.28, Trong tất cả, công việc của chúng tôi thu hẹp khoảng cách giữa mã hóa phổ biến và ngôn ngữ cụ, tiến tới hệ thống dịch chuyển máy nhiều chữ hoa có thể mềm dẻo được mở rộng trong môi trường học suốt đời.', 'uz': "Bir xil tili tarjima qilish davomida yangi tillarni qoʻshish uchun butun tizimni qayta ishlatish kerak. Bu qogʻozda biz tilning hususiy kodlash kodlash usuli asosida boshqa usulni boshqaramiz, va shunday qilib yangi tillarni qisqarli modullarni o'rganish orqali foydalanishimiz mumkin. Shunday qilib, biz bir necha xil tilni o'rganish uchun bir necha tilni o'rganamiz. Bizning imtiyozlarimizni ko'rsatadi, talab qilingan tugmalar birikmasi 3.28 BLEU pochta bilan universal code-decoder (3.28 BLEU) o'rtasida o'zgarishda yangi tillarni qoʻshishga ruxsat beradi. Boshqa modullarni qayta kelishi kerak emas. Hamma narsa, bizning ishimiz bir necha xil koddekdekdekdekdorlarining orasidagi gap yopiladi, va u hayotidagi o'rganish moslamalarida bir necha tillar tarjima tizimga uzoqchidi.", 'nl': 'Geavanceerde meertalige machinevertaling is gebaseerd op een universele encoder-decoder, waarvoor het hele systeem opnieuw moet worden opgeleid om nieuwe talen toe te voegen. In dit artikel stellen we een alternatieve aanpak voor die gebaseerd is op taalspecifieke encoder-decoders, en dus gemakkelijker kan worden uitgebreid naar nieuwe talen door hun bijbehorende modules te leren. Om een gemeenschappelijke interlingua vertegenwoordiging aan te moedigen, trainen we tegelijkertijd de N-begientalen. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat de voorgestelde aanpak de universele encoder-decoder gemiddeld met 3.28 BLEU punten overtreft, terwijl het mogelijk is om nieuwe talen toe te voegen zonder de rest van de modules opnieuw te trainen. Al met al dichten we de kloof tussen gedeelde en taalspecifieke encoderdecoders en gaan we verder naar modulaire meertalige machinevertaalsystemen die flexibel kunnen worden uitgebreid in omgevingen voor levenslang leren.', 'de': 'Moderne mehrsprachige maschinelle Übersetzung setzt auf einen universellen Encoder-Decoder, der eine Umschulung des gesamten Systems erfordert, um neue Sprachen hinzuzufügen. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir einen alternativen Ansatz vor, der auf sprachspezifischen Encoder-Decodern basiert und somit durch das Erlernen entsprechender Module einfacher auf neue Sprachen erweitert werden kann. Um eine gemeinsame Interlingua-Repräsentation zu fördern, trainieren wir gleichzeitig die N-Ausgangssprachen. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass der vorgeschlagene Ansatz den universellen Encoder-Decoder im Durchschnitt um 3,28 BLEU-Punkte übertrifft, während es erlaubt, neue Sprachen hinzuzufügen, ohne die restlichen Module umzuschulen. Alles in allem schließt unsere Arbeit die Lücke zwischen gemeinsamen und sprachspezifischen Encodercodern und entwickelt sich zu modularen mehrsprachigen maschinellen Übersetzungssystemen, die flexibel im Rahmen des lebenslangen Lernens erweitert werden können.', 'hr': 'Prevod multijezičkih strojeva država umjetnosti oslanja se na univerzalni koder-dekoder, koji zahtijeva povratak cijelog sustava za dodanje novih jezika. U ovom papiru predlažemo alternativni pristup koji se temelji na jezičkim koderima specifičnim koderima, i stoga se može lako proširiti na nove jezike učeći njihove odgovarajuće module. Kako bi se ohrabrili zajedničku interlingujsku predstavu, istovremeno treniramo početne jezike N. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da predloženi pristup iznosi univerzalni koder-dekoder u prosjeku 3,28 BLEU bodova, dok omogućava dodati nove jezike bez potrebe da povrati ostatak modula. Sve u svemu, naš rad zatvara prazninu između dijeljenih i specifičnih kodera jezika, napredujući prema modularnim multijezičkim sustavima prevoda strojeva koji mogu biti fleksivno prošireni u nastavima životnog učenja.', 'ko': '가장 선진적인 다국어 기계 번역은 유니버설 인코더-디코더에 의존하기 때문에 새로운 언어를 추가하기 위해 전체 시스템을 다시 교육해야 한다.본고에서 우리는 특정한 언어에 기반한 코딩기의 대체 방법을 제시했고 해당하는 모듈을 학습함으로써 새로운 언어로 더욱 쉽게 확장할 수 있다.공통된 언어 간의 표현을 격려하기 위해 우리는 동시에 N종의 초기 언어를 훈련한다.우리의 실험에 따르면 제시된 방법은 유니버설 인코더인 디코더보다 평균 3.28BLEU점 높으며, 동시에 새로운 언어를 추가할 수 있으며, 나머지 모듈을 다시 훈련할 필요가 없다.한마디로 하면 우리의 업무는 공유 인코더와 특정 언어 인코더 간의 격차를 좁히고 모듈화된 다언어 기계 번역 시스템을 향해 매진하며 이 시스템은 평생 학습 환경에서 유연하게 확장될 수 있다.', 'bg': 'Съвременният многоезичен машинен превод разчита на универсален кодер-декодер, който изисква преквалификация на цялата система за добавяне на нови езици. В настоящата статия предлагаме алтернативен подход, който се основава на специфични за езика кодери-декодери и по този начин може да бъде по-лесно разширен към нови езици чрез изучаване на съответните им модули. За да насърчим общото интерлингуално представяне, ние едновременно обучаваме N първоначалните езици. Нашите експерименти показват, че предложеният подход превъзхожда универсалния кодер-декодер средно с 3,28 точки, като същевременно позволява добавянето на нови езици, без да се налага преквалификация на останалите модули. Като цяло нашата работа затваря пропастта между споделените и специфичните за езика кодери, като напредва към модулни многоезични системи за машинен превод, които могат да бъдат гъвкаво разширени в условията на учене през целия живот.', 'da': 'Den nyeste flersprogede maskinoversættelse er baseret på en universel encoder-dekoder, som kræver omskoling af hele systemet for at tilføje nye sprog. I denne artikel foreslår vi en alternativ tilgang, der er baseret på sprogspecifikke encoder-dekodere og dermed lettere kan udvides til nye sprog ved at lære deres tilsvarende moduler. For at fremme en fælles intersproglig repræsentation træner vi samtidig de N oprindelige sprog. Vores eksperimenter viser, at den foreslåede fremgangsmåde overgår universel encoder-dekoder med 3,28 BLEU point i gennemsnit, samtidig med at det giver mulighed for at tilføje nye sprog uden behov for at omskole resten af modulerne. Alt i alt lukker vores arbejde kløften mellem delte og sprogspecifikke encoderkodere og går videre mod modulære flersprogede maskinoversættelsessystemer, der kan udvides fleksibelt i livslang læring.', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya mashine ya lugha mbalimbali inategemea kodi ya kodi ya kimataifa, ambayo inahitaji kurejesha mfumo mzima ili kuongeza lugha mpya. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza njia mbadala ambayo inategemea kuweka kwa lugha mahsusi, na kwa hiyo tunaweza kupanuka kwa urahisi zaidi katika lugha mpya kwa kujifunza vifaa vyao vinavyomilikiwa. Kwa hiyo kuhamasisha uwakilishi wa lugha moja kwa moja, tunafundisha lugha za awali za N. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu zilizopendekezwa inaonyesha kodi ya ulimwengu kwa pointi 3.28 BLEU kwa wastani, wakati unaruhusu kuongeza lugha mpya bila haja ya kurudisha vifaa vinginevyo. Kila kitu, kazi yetu inafunga tofauti kati ya decodi maalum za lugha zinazoshirikiana na lugha, na kuendelea kuelekea mfumo wa utafsiri wa mashine za lugha mbalimbali ambao unaweza kuongezeka kwa kiasi kikubwa katika mazingira ya kujifunza kwa muda mrefu.', 'id': 'Terkini terjemahan mesin berbagai bahasa bergantung pada kode-dekoder universal, yang membutuhkan pelatihan ulang seluruh sistem untuk menambah bahasa baru. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan pendekatan alternatif yang berdasarkan koder-dekoder-spesifik bahasa, dan dapat lebih mudah diperpanjangkan ke bahasa baru dengan mempelajari modul yang sesuai dengan mereka. Jadi untuk mendorong sebuah representation interbahasa umum, kita secara bersamaan melatih bahasa awal N. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan yang diusulkan melampaui pengekode universal dengan 3,28 poin BLEU rata-rata, sementara memungkinkan untuk menambah bahasa baru tanpa membutuhkan untuk melatih ulang sisa modul. Semuanya, pekerjaan kita menutup ruang antara koder berbagi dan koder spesifik bahasa, maju ke sistem terjemahan mesin berbagai bahasa modular yang dapat diperluaskan fleksibel dalam lingkungan belajar sepanjang hidup.', 'af': "State-of-the-art multilingual masjien vertaling aflyk op 'n universele enkoder-dekoder, wat benodig om die hele stelsel te herhaal om nuwe tale by te voeg. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n alternatiewe toegang wat gebaseer is op taal-spesifieke enkoder-dekodere, en dit kan daarom makliker uitbrei word na nuwe tale deur hulle ooreenstemmende modules te leer. So om 'n gemeenskaplike interlingua-voorstelling te bevestig, ons tref eenmaal die N aanvanklike tale. Ons eksperimente wys dat die voorgestelde toegang uitvoer die universele koder-dekoder deur 3.28 BLEU punte op gemiddelde, terwyl toelaat om nuwe tale te voeg sonder die nodig om die res van die modules te herhaal. Alles in alle, ons werk sluit die gap tussen gedeelde en taal-spesifieke koderdekers, wat versterk na modulare multitaalske masjien vertalingsstelsels wat fleksibel in die lewenlange onderringsinstellings kan wees.", 'sq': 'State-of-the-art multilingual machine translation relies on a universal encoder-decoder, which requires retraining the entire system to add new languages.  Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një qasje alternative që bazohet në koduesit specifikë gjuhës dhe kështu mund të zgjerohet më lehtë në gjuhët e reja duke mësuar modulet e tyre korrespondentë. Kështu që për të inkurajuar një përfaqësim të përbashkët ndërgjuhësh, ne njëkohësisht trajnojmë gjuhët fillestare N. Eksperimentet tona tregojnë se qasja e propozuar ekzekuton koduesin universal me 3.28 pikë BLEU mesatarisht, duke lejuar shtimin e gjuhëve të reja pa nevojën për të rindërtuar pjesën tjetër të moduleve. Gjithçka në tërësi, puna jonë mbyll dallimin midis koduesve të përbashkët dhe të specifikëve për gjuhën, duke përparuar drejt sistemeve modulare të përkthimit të makinave shumëgjuhëse që mund të zgjerohen fleksibel në ambientet e mësimit gjatë gjithë jetës.', 'tr': 'Çoklu diller taryhmasynyň durumynda ullanýan ködleme kodçysyna baglanýar. Bu sistemiň täze dilleri eklemek üçin bütin sistemini ýene almak gerek. Bu kagyzda, dil ködlemeleri taýýarlanan başga bir nusga teklip edip bilýäris we onuň üçin täze dillere meňzeşli modullerini öwrenip, täze dillere aňsatlyk uly açyp biler. Öyleyse ortak interlingua temsillerini terbiye etmek için, bu arada N başlangıç dillerini eğitiriz. Biziň deneylerimiz teklip eden ýagdaýyň 3.28 BLEU tarapynda uniwersal kodeýan kodeýasyny orta noktalardan üstün edýär. Diňe modularyň gaýd etmesi gereksiz täze diller eklemegine rugsat berýärler. Hemme zatda, işimiz bu ýerde paylaşyk we dil kodçularyň arasynda gapysyny ýapýar, modüler multi dil öwrenme sistemalarynda fleksibil öwrenme çarpyşynda öwrenme mümkin.', 'hy': 'State-of-the-art multilingual machine translation relies on a universal encoder-decoder, which requires retraining the entire system to add new languages.  In this paper, we propose an alternative approach that is based on language-specific encoder-decoders, and can thus be more easily extended to new languages by learning their corresponding modules.  Այսպիսով, որպեսզի խրախուսենք միջլեզվի ընդհանուր ներկայացումը, մենք միաժամանակ ուսուցանում ենք N-ի սկզբնական լեզուները: Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված մոտեցումը համընդհանուր կոդեր-կոդերը արտադրում է միջինում 3.28 միավորով, մինչդեռ թույլ է տալիս ավելացնել նոր լեզուներ առանց հարկավորության վերադասավորել մնացած մոդուլները: Ամբողջ ընդհանուր առումով, մեր աշխատանքը փակում է տարբերությունը տարածված և լեզվին հատուկ կոդերների միջև, առաջընթացքում դեպի մոդուլար բազլեզու մեքենայի թարգմանման համակարգեր, որոնք կարող են ճկուն ընդլայնվել կյանքի ընթացքում սովորելու', 'az': 'Möcüzə dillərinin çoxlu qurğulaması üniversal kodlayıcı-kodlayıcının üstündə təvəkkül edir. Bu sistemin yeni dilləri ekləməsi üçün bütün sistemi yenidən alması lazımdır. Bu kağızda, dil kodlayıcılarına dayanan alternatif bir metod təklif edirik və buna görə də onların uyğun modullarını öyrənərək yeni dillərə daha asanlaşdırılabilir. N ə ilk dillərini təhsil edirik. Bizim təcrübələrimiz göstərir ki, təcrübə olunan approach, digər modulların geri alması lazım olmadan, universel kodlayıcı kodlayıcının ortalama 3.28 BLEU noktalarına istifadə edir. Bütün işlərimiz, həyat öyrənməsi müəyyən edilən çoxlu dil qurğulama sistemlərinə çox genişlənir.', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین\u200cهای زیادی زبان\u200cهای هنر بر یک رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cی جهانی بستگی دارد که نیاز به بازیابی تمام سیستم برای افزودن زبان\u200cهای جدید است. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می کنیم یک روش alternativa که بر اساس رمزشناسی\u200cکننده\u200cکننده\u200cهای زبان خاص است، و به همین\u200cسان می\u200cتوانیم به زبان\u200cهای جدید با یاد گرفتن مدول\u200cهای متفاوت آنها به آسانتری افزایش دهیم. بنابراین برای تشویق نمایش بین زبان\u200cهای معمولی، همزمان زبان\u200cهای اولیه N را آموزش می\u200cدهیم. آزمایش\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که این دستور پیشنهاد با توجه به اندازهٔ ۳.۲۸ نقطه\u200cهای بلوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئوئ در هر صورت، کارمون فاصله بین رمزشناسی\u200cکننده\u200cهای مشترک و ویژه\u200cهای زبان را بسته می\u200cکند، که به سوی سیستم\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین\u200cهای متوسط زبان\u200cها پیشرفت می\u200cکند که می\u200cتواند در تنظیمات یادگیری\u200cهای طولانی عمر فراخ شود', 'bn': 'রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের মাল্টিভাল মেশিন অনুবাদ নির্ভর করে একটি বিশ্বব্যাপী এনকোডার- ডেকোডারের উপর, যা নতুন ভাষায় যোগ করার জন্ এই পত্রিকায় আমরা একটি বিকল্প পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি যা ভাষায় নির্দিষ্ট এনকোডার-ডেকোডারের ভিত্তিতে ভিত্তিক, আর তাই তাদের সংশ্লিষ্ট মডিউল তাই একটি সাধারণ ইন্টারলিঙ্গুয়া প্রতিনিধিত্বের উৎসাহ প্রদান করার জন্য আমরা একই সাথে N প্রথম ভাষাকে প্রশিক্ষণ দ আমাদের পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি বিশ্বব্যাপী এনকোডার-ডেকোডারের মাধ্যমে ৩. ২৮ বিলিউ বিন্দুর মাধ্যমে বিশ্বব্যাপী ক সবকিছুতেই আমাদের কাজ শেয়ার করা এবং ভাষার বিশেষ এনকোডেকোডারের মধ্যে বিভেদ বন্ধ করে দেয়, যা মোডুলাল মাল্টিভাল মেশিন অনুবাদ সিস্টেমের দিকে উন্নয়ন', 'bs': 'Državni multijezički prevod uređaja oslanja se na univerzalni koder, koji zahtijeva povratak cijelog sistema da doda nove jezike. U ovom papiru predlažemo alternativni pristup koji se temelji na jezičkim koderama specifičnim koderama, i stoga se može lako proširiti na nove jezike učeći njihove odgovarajuće module. Da bismo poticali zajedničku interlinguu predstavu, trenirali smo početne jezike N. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da predloženi pristup iznosi univerzalni koder-dekoder u prosjeku 3,28 BLEU bodova, dok omogućava dodati nove jezike bez potrebe da povrati ostatak modula. Sve u svemu, naš rad zatvara prazninu između dijeljenih i specifičnih kodera jezika, napredujući prema modularnim multijezičkim sistemima prevoda mašina koji mogu biti fleksibilno prošireni u nastavama životnog učenja.', 'am': 'የ-ሀገር-የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ትርጉም አዲስ ቋንቋዎች ለመጨመር በዓለምአቀፍ የኮድድ-ኮድ ታድራለች፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ቋንቋ-አቋራጭ የሆኑት የፊደል ኮድ-አዳራጊዎችን በመሠረት ላይ የተለወጠውን ልውቀት እናስፈቅዳለን፡፡ ስለዚህም የኢን መጀመሪያ ቋንቋዎችን እናስተምራለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን አዲስ ቋንቋዎች ለመጨመር ባስፈቃዱ ቁጥጥር በ3.28 ቢሊዩን ነጥቦች የሚያሳየው የዓለምአቀፍ ኮድድ-አዲስ መስኮት ነው፡፡ በሁሉም፣ ሥራችን በተለየ ቋንቋ እና ቋንቋ-አካባቢ የሆኑት የክፍተቶችን ግንኙነት ይዘጋጅታል፤ በዕድሜ ትምህርት ተማር ግንኙነታችን በብልልልቋል ቋንቋዎች ትርጉም ሲስተካከሉ ይዘጋጅተዋል፡፡', 'ca': "State-of-the-art multilingual machine translation relies on a universal encoder-decoder, which requires retraining the entire system to add new languages.  En aquest paper, proposem un enfocament alternativ basat en codificadors específics per llenguatge i, per tant, pot ser més fàcil d'estendre a les noves llengües aprenent els seus móduls correspondents. So as to encourage a common interlingua representation, we simultaneously train the N initial languages.  Els nostres experiments demostren que l'enfocament proposat supera el codificador universal en una mitjana de 3,28 punts BLEU, mentre permet afegir llengües noves sense la necessitat de repetir la resta dels móduls. Tot i tot, la nostra feina tanca la diferència entre codificadors compartits i específics per llenguatge, avançant cap a sistemes modulars multilingües de traducció de màquines que poden estendre flexiblement en entorns d'aprenentatge durant tota la vida.", 'cs': 'Nejmodernější vícejazyčný strojový překlad se opírá o univerzální kodér-dekodér, který vyžaduje přeškolení celého systému pro přidání nových jazyků. V tomto článku navrhujeme alternativní přístup, který je založen na jazykově specifických kodérech dekodérů, a který lze snadněji rozšířit na nové jazyky učením se jejich odpovídajících modulů. Abychom podpořili společnou interlinguovou reprezentaci, současně trénujeme N počáteční jazyky. Naše experimenty ukazují, že navržený přístup předčí univerzální kodér-dekodér o 3,28 BLEU body v průměru, přičemž umožňuje přidávat nové jazyky bez nutnosti přeškolení zbytku modulů. Celkově řečeno, naše práce uzavírá propast mezi sdílenými a jazykově specifickými kodéry a postupuje směrem k modulárním vícejazyčným systémům strojového překladu, které lze flexibilně rozšířit v prostředí celoživotního učení.', 'et': 'Tipptasemel mitmekeelne masintõlge tugineb universaalsele kodeerijale-dekooderile, mis nõuab kogu süsteemi ümberõpetamist uute keelte lisamiseks. Käesolevas dokumendis pakume välja alternatiivse lähenemisviisi, mis põhineb keelespetsiifilistel kodeerijatel-dekoodritel ja mida saab seega hõlpsamini laiendada uutele keeltele, õppides nende vastavaid mooduleid. Et soodustada ühist interkeelte esindamist, koolitame samaaegselt N algkeeli. Meie katsed näitavad, et kavandatud lähenemisviis ületab universaalset kodeerijat-dekooderit keskmiselt 3,28 BLEU punkti, võimaldades lisada uusi keeli ilma ülejäänud mooduleid ümberõpetamata. Kokkuvõttes kaotab meie töö lõhe jagatud ja keelespetsiifiliste kodeerijate vahel, arendades moodulsete mitmekeelsete masintõlkesüsteemide poole, mida saab paindlikult laiendada elukestva õppe tingimustes.', 'fi': 'Nykyaikainen monikielinen konekäännös perustuu yleismaailmalliseen kooderi-dekooderiin, joka edellyttää koko järjestelmän uudelleenkoulutusta uusien kielten lisäämiseksi. Tässä työssä ehdotamme vaihtoehtoista lähestymistapaa, joka perustuu kielikohtaisiin kooderi-dekoodereihin ja joka voidaan siten laajentaa helpommin uusille kielille oppimalla niiden vastaavat moduulit. Yhteisen interkieliedustuksen edistämiseksi koulutamme samanaikaisesti N-alkukieliä. Kokeet osoittavat, että ehdotettu lähestymistapa ylittää universaalin kooder-dekooderin keskimäärin 3,28 BLEU-pisteellä, samalla kun se mahdollistaa uusien kielten lisäämisen tarvitsematta uudelleenkouluttaa muita moduuleja. Kaiken kaikkiaan työmme kuroo umpeen jaettujen ja kielikohtaisten koodaajien välistä kuilua ja etenee kohti modulaarisia monikielisiä konekäännösjärjestelmiä, joita voidaan joustavasti laajentaa elinikäisessä oppimisessa.', 'ha': "@ action: button Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata hanyarwa na dabar-daban wanda ke asata a kan koda-bayan-kode-na'ura, kuma kan a iya ƙara wa zane-zane a cikin zane-yanzu, da karanta moduli masu daidai. Ina iya ƙara wa masu gayin lugha da ɗammani, ko da kuma, muna sanar da harshen na farko na N. Kayan jarrabõyinmu na nũna cewa, hanyarMu da aka buɗe kode-kodi na ɗabi'a 3.28 BLEU na daidaita, kuma yana yarda a ƙara wasu harshen sãbuwa, kuma bã da ƙayyade ya sake tsari da ake baka. Dukan da duk, aikinmu yana rufe tsakanin kodkode masu raba da cikin harshen da aka ƙayyade, kuma yana tsẽfẽwa zuwa tsarin tarjibu masu turjuya da mulki'ura da za'a iya faɗaɗa bayan a cikin tsarin da za'a sanar da shi.", 'sk': 'Najsodobnejši večjezični strojni prevod temelji na univerzalnem kodirniku-dekoderju, ki zahteva preusposabljanje celotnega sistema za dodajanje novih jezikov. V prispevku predlagamo alternativni pristop, ki temelji na jezikovno specifičnih kodirnih dekoderjih in ga je tako mogoče lažje razširiti na nove jezike z učenjem ustreznih modulov. Da bi spodbudili skupno interjezikovno reprezentacijo, hkrati usposabljamo začetne jezike N. Naši poskusi kažejo, da predlagani pristop v povprečju presega univerzalni kodirnik-dekoder za 3,28 točke BLEU, hkrati pa omogoča dodajanje novih jezikov brez potrebe po preusposabljanju ostalih modulov. Naše delo na splošno zapolnjuje vrzel med skupnimi in jezikovnimi kodirniki ter napreduje v modularnih večjezičnih sistemih strojnega prevajanja, ki jih je mogoče prožno razširiti v okoljih vseživljenjskega učenja.', 'he': 'State-of-the-art multilingual machine translation relies on a universal encoder-decoder, which requires retraining the entire system to add new languages.  בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים גישה אלטרנטיבית שמבוססת על קודפים-קודפים ספציפיים לשפה, וכך אפשר להתרחב בקלות יותר לשפות חדשות על ידי ללמוד את המודולים המתאימים שלהם. כדי לעודד מייצג בין שפות משותף, אנו באותו הזמן מאמן את שפות ההתחלה N. הניסויים שלנו מראים שהגישה המוצעת מעלית את הקודר האוניברסלי על 3.28 נקודות BLEU בממוצע, בזמן שהאפשרות להוסיף שפות חדשות בלי הצורך לאמן מחדש את שאר המודולים. בכל אופן, העבודה שלנו סוגרת את הפער בין קודרים משותפים ולשפות ספציפיים, מתקדמים לכיוון מערכות תרגום מכונות רבות שפות מודולריות שאפשר להאריך בצורה גמישה במסגרות הלימודים לאורך כל החיים.', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་གསར་བ་ཁ་སྣོན་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་འདིའི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་གཏན་ཁེལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་བཀོད་པའི་གྲངས་སྤྱོད་གཞན་ཞིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་དབར་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་གཅིག་གམོ་གཏོང་གི་འགོ་འཛུགས་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཤིག་ལ་རྒྱས་གཏོང་། ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་གྱིས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ཡོངས་ཁྱབ་མཁན་གྱི་ཨིན་ཀོ་ཌིར་ཌིར་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཚད་གཞི་གསུམ་ཉུང་བའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གསུམ འདི་ཆ་ཚང་མས་ང་ཚོའི་ལས་སྤྱོད་ཀྱིས་དབར་གཅིག་མཐུན་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་བར་སྟོང་འདུག', 'jv': 'Tarjamahan-sampeyan karo akeh luwih akeh akeh penjelantar menyang nang koder-akeh universal, sing nyatakake tanggal sistem kut nambah idiwang Anyar. Nang pewiir iki, awak dhéwé ngerasakno akeh Alternate sing basa ning koder-nggawe langga, lan kaya iso diandelak luwih bantuan kanggo langa anyar tentang kanggo mulai modulo sing dianggap. Dadine mbok perbudhakan langkung wigatining pasakno, kita sampeyan nggawe banget N sedhaya cekak. Awak dhéwé éntuk ngéwangaké diangkat oleh nggawe koder-koder universel kanggo telu.30 blek tentang kanggo kalawat, sampek iso ngubah idiomat anyar sampeyan ora bisa ngemulasai winih dhéwé. Lah ning saben, akeh gunggo punika dipun ajeng karo akeh koder sing nggawe banget karo langga'}
{'en': 'Identifying Named Entities as they are Typed', 'ar': 'تحديد الكيانات المسماة كما تم كتابتها', 'fr': 'Identifier les entités nommées au fur et à mesure de leur saisie', 'es': 'Identificación de entidades nombradas a medida que se escriben', 'pt': 'Identificando Entidades Nomeadas à medida que são digitadas', 'zh': '以键入名实识之', 'hi': 'नामित निकायों की पहचान करना जैसे वे टाइप किए गए हैं', 'ja': '型指定されている名前付きエンティティの識別', 'ru': 'Идентификация именованных сущностей по мере их ввода', 'ga': 'Aonáin Ainmnithe a Aithint de réir mar a Chlóscríobhtar iad', 'ka': 'სახელი ინტერტიების განსაზღვრება როგორც ისინი ტიპულია', 'el': 'Αναγνώριση των Ονόματων Οντότητας κατά την πληκτρολόγηση', 'hu': 'Megnevezett szervezetek azonosítása gépelés közben', 'it': 'Identificare le entità nominate come digitate', 'kk': 'Аталған нысандарды келтіру', 'lt': 'Pavadintų subjektų identifikavimas pagal jų tipą', 'mk': 'Идентификуваат именувани ентитети како што се типирани', 'ms': 'Mengenalpasti Entiti bernama semasa mereka ditaip', 'ml': 'ടൈപ്പ് ചെയ്തിരിക്കുന്ന പേരുള്ള എന്റിറ്റുകള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുക', 'mt': 'L-Identifikazzjoni ta’ Entitajiet Imsemmija kif huma Tipizzati', 'mn': 'Шинэ нэрлэгдсэн элементүүдийг тодорхойлох нь', 'no': 'Identifiserer namnet einingar som dei er skriven', 'pl': 'Identyfikacja nazwanych podmiotów w trakcie ich wpisywania', 'ro': 'Identificarea entităților denumite pe măsură ce sunt tastate', 'sr': 'Identifikovanje imenovanih entiteta kao što su napisane', 'so': 'Aqoonsiga magaca', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'உள்ளிடும் போது பெயரிடப்பட்ட உள்ளீடுகளை அடையாளம் செய்', 'sv': 'Identifiera namngivna enheter när de skrivs', 'ur': 'نام کی عبارت کو پہچان کر رہا ہے جیسے وہ تایپ کر رہے ہیں', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Nhận diện các thực thể có tên như in.', 'bg': 'Идентифициране на названите субекти по начина, по който са написани', 'nl': 'Benaamde entiteiten identificeren zoals ze worden getypt', 'hr': 'Identificiranje imenovanih područja kao što su pisane', 'da': 'Identificering af navngivne enheder, efterhånden som de indtastes', 'de': 'Identifizierung benannter Entitäten während der Eingabe', 'ko': '명명된 엔티티를 가져올 때 해당 엔티티 식별', 'fa': 'شناسایی واحدهای نامیده به عنوان نوشته شده\u200cاند', 'sw': 'Kutambua Vitabu vinavyoitwa kama vinavyoandikwa', 'id': 'Mengidentifikasi Entitas bernama seperti mereka ditaip', 'tr': 'Ad bilen hili ýazylýan bolmagyny tanyşdyrylýar', 'am': 'Identifying Named Entities as they are Typed', 'af': 'Identifikasie Genaamde Eenheids soos hulle ingetik word', 'sq': 'Duke identifikuar njësitë e emëruara sipas tipit', 'bn': 'নামের এন্টিটিগুলো টাইপ করার সময় পরিচয় করা হবে', 'bs': 'Identificiranje imenovanih entiteta kao što su pisane', 'az': 'ƒ∞smim Entit…ôl…ôrini yazdƒ±qlarƒ± kimi tanƒ±ma', 'hy': 'Նվայնված առանձնավորությունների հայտնաբերումը ըստ իրենց տիպերի', 'et': 'Nimetatud üksuste tuvastamine tüüpi kujul', 'ca': 'Identificar les Entitats Nomades segons el tipus', 'cs': 'Identifikace jmenovaných subjektů při zadání', 'fi': 'Nimettyjen yksiköiden tunnistaminen sellaisina kuin ne on kirjoitettu', 'ha': 'Suna gane wasu abubuwa da aka suna', 'he': 'מזהה יחידות בשמות כפי שהן מסוגלות', 'jv': 'name-of-ssh-key', 'sk': 'Identifikacija imenovanih subjektov, kot so tipkani', 'bo': 'མིང་ཡོད་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ལ་འཛུགས་སྟངས་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Identifying named entities in written text is an essential component of the text processing pipeline used in applications such as text editors to gain a better understanding of the semantics of the text. However, the typical experimental setup for evaluating Named Entity Recognition (NER) systems is not directly applicable to systems that process text in real time as the text is being typed. Evaluation is performed on a sentence level assuming the end-user is willing to wait until the entire sentence is typed for entities to be identified and further linked to identifiers or co-referenced. We introduce a novel experimental setup for NER systems for applications where decisions about named entity boundaries need to be performed in an online fashion. We study how state-of-the-art methods perform under this setup in multiple languages and propose adaptations to these models to suit this new experimental setup. Experimental results show that the best systems that are evaluated on each token after its typed, reach performance within 15 F1 points of systems that are evaluated at the end of the sentence. These show that entity recognition can be performed in this setup and open up the development of other NLP tools in a similar setup.', 'ar': 'يعد تحديد الكيانات المسماة في النص المكتوب مكونًا أساسيًا في خط أنابيب معالجة النص المستخدم في تطبيقات مثل محرري النصوص للحصول على فهم أفضل لدلالات النص. ومع ذلك ، فإن الإعداد التجريبي المعتاد لتقييم أنظمة التعرف على الكيانات المسماة (NER) لا ينطبق بشكل مباشر على الأنظمة التي تعالج النص في الوقت الفعلي أثناء كتابة النص. يتم إجراء التقييم على مستوى الجملة بافتراض أن المستخدم النهائي على استعداد للانتظار حتى يتم كتابة الجملة بأكملها حتى يتم تحديد الكيانات وربطها بالمعرفات أو الإشارة إليها بشكل مشترك. نقدم إعدادًا تجريبيًا جديدًا لأنظمة NER للتطبيقات حيث يجب تنفيذ القرارات المتعلقة بحدود الكيانات المسماة بطريقة عبر الإنترنت. ندرس كيفية أداء أحدث الأساليب في ظل هذا الإعداد بلغات متعددة ونقترح تعديلات على هذه النماذج لتلائم هذا الإعداد التجريبي الجديد. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن أفضل الأنظمة التي يتم تقييمها على كل رمز بعد كتابته ، تصل إلى الأداء في حدود 1-5 نقاط F1 للأنظمة التي يتم تقييمها في نهاية الجملة. تُظهر هذه أنه يمكن إجراء التعرف على الكيانات في هذا الإعداد وفتح تطوير أدوات البرمجة اللغوية العصبية الأخرى في إعداد مماثل.', 'fr': "L'identification des entités nommées dans le texte écrit est un élément essentiel du pipeline de traitement de texte utilisé dans des applications telles que les éditeurs de texte pour mieux comprendre la sémantique du texte. Cependant, la configuration expérimentale typique pour évaluer les systèmes de reconnaissance d'entités nommées (NER) n'est pas directement applicable aux systèmes qui traitent du texte en temps réel pendant la saisie du texte. L'évaluation est effectuée au niveau de la phrase en supposant que l'utilisateur final est prêt à attendre que la phrase entière soit saisie pour que les entités soient identifiées et liées à des identificateurs ou à des coréférencements. Nous introduisons une nouvelle configuration expérimentale pour les systèmes NER pour les applications où les décisions concernant les limites des entités nommées doivent être prises en ligne. Nous étudions les performances des méthodes de pointe dans cette configuration dans plusieurs langues et proposons des adaptations à ces modèles pour s'adapter à cette nouvelle configuration expérimentale. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que les meilleurs systèmes évalués sur chaque jeton après son typage atteignent des performances de 1 à 5 points F1 des systèmes évalués à la fin de la phrase. Ils montrent que la reconnaissance d'entité peut être effectuée dans cette configuration et ouvrent le développement d'autres outils de NLP dans une configuration similaire.", 'pt': 'Identificar entidades nomeadas em texto escrito é um componente essencial do pipeline de processamento de texto usado em aplicativos como editores de texto para obter uma melhor compreensão da semântica do texto. No entanto, a configuração experimental típica para avaliar sistemas de Reconhecimento de Entidade Nomeada (NER) não é diretamente aplicável a sistemas que processam texto em tempo real enquanto o texto está sendo digitado. A avaliação é realizada em um nível de sentença assumindo que o usuário final está disposto a esperar até que a sentença inteira seja digitada para que as entidades sejam identificadas e posteriormente vinculadas a identificadores ou co-referenciadas. Apresentamos uma nova configuração experimental para sistemas NER para aplicações em que as decisões sobre os limites de entidades nomeadas precisam ser realizadas de forma online. Estudamos como os métodos de última geração se comportam nessa configuração em várias linguagens e propomos adaptações a esses modelos para se adequarem a essa nova configuração experimental. Resultados experimentais mostram que os melhores sistemas que são avaliados em cada token após sua digitação alcançam desempenho dentro de 1-5 pontos F1 dos sistemas que são avaliados no final da sentença. Isso mostra que o reconhecimento de entidade pode ser realizado nesta configuração e abre o desenvolvimento de outras ferramentas de PNL em uma configuração semelhante.', 'es': 'La identificación de entidades nombradas en el texto escrito es un componente esencial del proceso de procesamiento de textos que se utiliza en aplicaciones como los editores de texto para comprender mejor la semántica del texto. Sin embargo, la configuración experimental típica para evaluar los sistemas de Reconocimiento de Entidades Nombradas (NER) no se aplica directamente a los sistemas que procesan texto en tiempo real mientras se escribe el texto. La evaluación se realiza a nivel de oración asumiendo que el usuario final está dispuesto a esperar hasta que se escriba toda la oración para que las entidades se identifiquen y se vinculen a los identificadores o se correferencien. Presentamos una configuración experimental novedosa para sistemas NER para aplicaciones en las que las decisiones sobre los límites de las entidades nombradas deben realizarse en línea. Estudiamos el rendimiento de los métodos más avanzados bajo esta configuración en varios idiomas y proponemos adaptaciones a estos modelos para adaptarse a esta nueva configuración experimental. Los resultados experimentales muestran que los mejores sistemas que se evalúan en cada token después de su tipado, alcanzan un rendimiento dentro de 1 a 5 puntos F1 de los sistemas que se evalúan al final de la oración. Estos muestran que el reconocimiento de entidades se puede realizar en esta configuración y abren el desarrollo de otras herramientas de PNL en una configuración similar.', 'ja': 'テキストで名前付きエンティティを識別することは、テキストエディタなどのアプリケーションで使用されるテキスト処理パイプラインの必須コンポーネントであり、テキストの意味論をよりよく理解することができます。 しかしながら、名前付きエンティティ認識（ ＮＥＲ ）システムを評価するための典型的な実験的セットアップは、テキストが入力されているときにテキストをリアルタイムで処理するシステムに直接適用できない。 評価は、エンドユーザーが、エンティティが識別され、識別子または共同参照にさらにリンクされるために、文全体が入力されるまで待つことを仮定して、文レベルで実行されます。 名前付きエンティティの境界に関する決定がオンラインで実行される必要があるアプリケーションのための、NERシステムのための新規の実験的設定を紹介します。 私たちは、複数の言語でこのセットアップの下で最先端の方法がどのように機能するかを研究し、この新しい実験的セットアップに適したこれらのモデルへの適応を提案します。 実験結果は、各トークンが入力された後に評価される最高のシステムが、文末に評価されるシステムの1〜5 F 1ポイント以内のパフォーマンスに達することを示しています。 これらは、エンティティ認識をこのセットアップで実行し、同様のセットアップで他のNLPツールの開発を開くことができることを示しています。', 'zh': '识书面文本名实体者,文本治管道之要组成部分,所以施于文本编辑器等应用程序,以益知文本之语义。 然质名实体 (NER) 系统之典实验设非直宜于键入文本实时处理文本之统也。 于句级上行评估,假设最终用户愿待键入全句后方能识实体而更链接至标识符或同引用。 为NER系统引入一新实验设,以在线名实界之应用程序。 臣等考其最先进之法,于多种语言置之,并议调正以应实验。 实验结果表明,标记上键入后评估最佳,句末评统在1-5F1点内性能。 此明实体可知于此,而开NLP具于类者也。', 'ru': 'Идентификация именованных сущностей в письменном тексте является важным компонентом конвейера обработки текста, используемого в приложениях, таких как текстовые редакторы, для лучшего понимания семантики текста. Тем не менее, типичная экспериментальная настройка для оценки систем распознавания именованных сущностей (NER) не применима непосредственно к системам, которые обрабатывают текст в режиме реального времени во время ввода текста. Оценка выполняется на уровне предложения, при условии, что конечный пользователь готов подождать, пока все предложение не будет напечатано, чтобы идентифицировать объекты и далее связать их с идентификаторами или ссылками. Мы вводим новую экспериментальную установку для NER-систем для приложений, где решения о границах именованных сущностей должны выполняться в режиме онлайн. Мы изучаем, как современные методы работают под этой установкой в нескольких языках и предлагаем адаптации к этим моделям, чтобы соответствовать этой новой экспериментальной установке. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что лучшие системы, которые оцениваются на каждом токене после его ввода, достигают производительности в пределах 1–5 F1 баллов систем, которые оцениваются в конце предложения. Они показывают, что распознавание сущностей может быть выполнено в этой настройке, и открывают разработку других инструментов NLP в аналогичной настройке.', 'hi': 'लिखित पाठ में नामित संस्थाओं की पहचान करना पाठ के शब्दार्थ की बेहतर समझ प्राप्त करने के लिए पाठ संपादकों जैसे अनुप्रयोगों में उपयोग की जाने वाली पाठ प्रसंस्करण पाइपलाइन का एक आवश्यक घटक है। हालाँकि, नामित एंटिटी पहचान (NER) सिस्टम का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए विशिष्ट प्रयोगात्मक सेटअप सीधे उन सिस्टमों पर लागू नहीं होता है जो पाठ को वास्तविक समय में संसाधित करते हैं क्योंकि पाठ टाइप किया जा रहा है। मूल्यांकन एक वाक्य स्तर पर किया जाता है, यह मानते हुए कि अंतिम-उपयोगकर्ता तब तक प्रतीक्षा करने के लिए तैयार है जब तक कि पूरे वाक्य को पहचानने के लिए संस्थाओं के लिए टाइप नहीं किया जाता है और आगे पहचानकर्ताओं या सह-संदर्भित से जुड़ा होता है। हम अनुप्रयोगों के लिए एनईआर सिस्टम के लिए एक उपन्यास प्रयोगात्मक सेटअप पेश करते हैं जहां नामित इकाई सीमाओं के बारे में निर्णय ऑनलाइन फैशन में किए जाने की आवश्यकता होती है। हम अध्ययन करते हैं कि कई भाषाओं में इस सेटअप के तहत अत्याधुनिक तरीके कैसे प्रदर्शन करते हैं और इस नए प्रयोगात्मक सेटअप के अनुरूप इन मॉडलों के अनुकूलन का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि सबसे अच्छी प्रणालियां जो इसके टाइप किए जाने के बाद प्रत्येक टोकन पर मूल्यांकन की जाती हैं, वाक्य के अंत में मूल्यांकन किए जाने वाले सिस्टम के 1-5 एफ 1 बिंदुओं के भीतर प्रदर्शन तक पहुंचती हैं। ये दिखाते हैं कि एंटिटी पहचान इस सेटअप में की जा सकती है और एक समान सेटअप में अन्य एनएलपी उपकरणों के विकास को खोल सकती है।', 'ga': "Tá sainaithint aonáin ainmnithe i dtéacs scríofa ina chuid riachtanach den phíblíne próiseála téacs a úsáidtear in feidhmchláir ar nós eagarthóirí téacs chun tuiscint níos fearr a fháil ar shéimeantaic an téacs. Mar sin féin, níl an socrú trialach tipiciúil chun córais Aitheantais Aonáin Ainmnithe (NER) a mheas infheidhme go díreach maidir le córais a phróiseálann téacs i bhfíor-am agus an téacs á chlóscríobh. Déantar an mheastóireacht ar leibhéal na habairte ag glacadh leis go bhfuil an críoch-úsáideoir toilteanach fanacht go dtí go mbeidh an abairt iomlán clóscríofa chun eintitis a shainaithint agus a nascadh le haitheantóirí nó le comhthagairtí. Tugaimid isteach socrú turgnamhach nua do chórais NER d'fheidhmchláir nuair is gá cinntí faoi theorainneacha aonáin ainmnithe a dhéanamh ar líne. Déanaimid staidéar ar conas a fheidhmíonn modhanna úrscothacha faoin socrú seo i dteangacha iolracha agus molaimid oiriúnuithe ar na múnlaí sin chun freastal ar an leagan amach trialach nua seo. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go sroicheann na córais is fearr a ndéantar meastóireacht orthu ar gach comhartha tar éis a chlóscríofa, feidhmíocht laistigh de 1-5 phointe F1 de chórais a ndéantar meastóireacht orthu ag deireadh na habairte. Léiríonn siad seo gur féidir aitheantas aonáin a dhéanamh sa socrú seo agus go n-osclaítear forbairt uirlisí NLP eile i socrú comhchosúil.", 'el': 'Ο εντοπισμός ονομάτων οντοτήτων σε γραπτό κείμενο είναι ένα ουσιαστικό στοιχείο της αγωγής επεξεργασίας κειμένου που χρησιμοποιείται σε εφαρμογές όπως οι επεξεργαστές κειμένου για να αποκτήσουν μια καλύτερη κατανόηση της σημασιολογίας του κειμένου. Ωστόσο, η τυπική πειραματική ρύθμιση για την αξιολόγηση συστημάτων αναγνώρισης ονομαστικών οντοτήτων (NER) δεν εφαρμόζεται άμεσα σε συστήματα που επεξεργάζονται κείμενο σε πραγματικό χρόνο καθώς πληκτρολογείται το κείμενο. Η αξιολόγηση πραγματοποιείται σε επίπεδο πρότασης υπό την προϋπόθεση ότι ο τελικός χρήστης είναι πρόθυμος να περιμένει μέχρι να πληκτρολογηθεί ολόκληρη η πρόταση για να αναγνωριστούν οντότητες και να συνδεθούν περαιτέρω με αναγνωριστικά ή να συνδυαστούν. Παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα πειραματική ρύθμιση για συστήματα για εφαρμογές όπου οι αποφάσεις σχετικά με τα οριακά όρια της οντότητας πρέπει να εκτελούνται με διαδικτυακό τρόπο. Μελετάμε πώς λειτουργούν οι σύγχρονες μέθοδοι σε πολλαπλές γλώσσες και προτείνουμε προσαρμογές σε αυτά τα μοντέλα ώστε να ταιριάζουν σε αυτή τη νέα πειραματική ρύθμιση. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι τα καλύτερα συστήματα που αξιολογούνται σε κάθε μάρκα μετά την πληκτρολόγηση του, επιτυγχάνουν απόδοση εντός των σημείων 1–5 των συστημάτων που αξιολογούνται στο τέλος της πρότασης. Αυτά δείχνουν ότι η αναγνώριση οντότητας μπορεί να πραγματοποιηθεί σε αυτή τη ρύθμιση και ανοίγουν την ανάπτυξη άλλων εργαλείων σε μια παρόμοια ρύθμιση.', 'ka': 'წერტილი ტექსტის სახელი ინტერსტის განსაზღვრება არის ტექსტის გამოყენებული პროცესის კომპონენტი, როგორც ტექსტის რედაქტორები ტექსტის სიმენტიკის უკეთესი გაგრძნობისთვი მაგრამ, ტიპური ექსპერიმენტიური განსხვავება სახელი ინტერტივის განსხვავება (NER) სისტემებისთვის სისტემებისთვის პროცესის ტექსტის რეალურ დროში არ მოსაძლევა, როგორც ტექსტი განსაზღვრება გავაკეთებულია სიტყვების დონეში, რომელიც დასრულებული მომხმარებელი მოთხოვრება, სანამ უფრო მსგავსი სიტყვები დაიწერა ინტერნეტიების განსაზღვრება და დამატებული ინტერ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ პრომენტის ექსპერიმენტიური დავყენება NER სისტემებისთვის პროგრამებისთვის, სადაც სახელსახულების განსაზღვრებები უნდა იყოს ინტერნეტიური განზღვრე ჩვენ ვისწავლით, როგორ სურათების მეტი ამ სურათის ნაწილად მრავალური ენაში გავაკეთებთ და ამ მოდელთან აეპოტაციები გავაკეთებთ ამ ახალი ექსპერიმენტიური სურათ ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები აჩვენებს, რომ ყველა წარმოდგენის შემდეგ საუკეთესო სისტემები, რომლებიც ყოველ წარმოდგენა, მიიღებთ 1–5 F1 წარმოდგენების შესაძლებლო ეს გამოჩვენება, რომ ინტერტის განაცნობა შეიძლება იყოს ამ სხვა NLP ხელსაწყოთან განვითარებაში და გახსნა სხვა NLP ხელსაწყოთან განვითარებაში.', 'hu': 'A megnevezett entitások írásos szövegben történő azonosítása az olyan alkalmazásokban, mint például a szövegszerkesztők esetében használt szövegfeldolgozási folyamat alapvető eleme annak, hogy jobban megértsék a szöveg szemantikáját. A nevezett entitás felismerésének (NER) rendszereinek értékelésére szolgáló tipikus kísérleti beállítás azonban nem alkalmazható közvetlenül azokra a rendszerekre, amelyek a szöveg beírása közben valós időben dolgozzák fel a szöveget. Az értékelés mondatszinten történik, feltételezve, hogy a végfelhasználó hajlandó várni, amíg a teljes mondat gépelésre kerül, hogy az entitások azonosíthatók legyenek és tovább kapcsolódjanak azonosítókhoz vagy társrahivatkozhassanak. Új kísérleti beállítást vezetünk be NER rendszerekhez olyan alkalmazásokhoz, ahol a nevezett entitás határaival kapcsolatos döntéseket online módon kell elvégezni. Tanulmányozzuk, hogyan teljesítenek a legkorszerűbb módszerek ebben a beállításban több nyelven, és javaslatot teszünk ezekhez a modellekhez, hogy megfeleljenek ehhez az új kísérleti beállításhoz. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy az egyes tokeneken értékelt legjobb rendszerek 1–5 F1 ponton belül érnek el teljesítményt a mondat végén értékelt rendszerektől. Ezek azt mutatják, hogy az entitások felismerése ebben a beállításban végrehajtható, és megnyitják más NLP eszközök fejlesztését egy hasonló beállításban.', 'it': "Identificare entità nominate nel testo scritto è un componente essenziale della pipeline di elaborazione del testo utilizzata in applicazioni come editor di testo per ottenere una migliore comprensione della semantica del testo. Tuttavia, la configurazione sperimentale tipica per la valutazione dei sistemi di riconoscimento delle entità nominate (NER) non è direttamente applicabile ai sistemi che elaborano il testo in tempo reale mentre il testo viene digitato. La valutazione viene eseguita a livello di frase supponendo che l'utente finale sia disposto ad aspettare che l'intera frase sia digitata affinché le entità siano identificate e ulteriormente collegate a identificatori o co-referenziate. Introduciamo una nuova configurazione sperimentale per i sistemi NER per applicazioni in cui le decisioni sui confini delle entità nominate devono essere eseguite in modo online. Studiamo come funzionano i metodi all'avanguardia con questo setup in più lingue e proponiamo adattamenti a questi modelli per adattarsi a questo nuovo setup sperimentale. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che i migliori sistemi valutati su ogni token dopo la digitazione raggiungono prestazioni entro 1-5 punti F1 dei sistemi valutati alla fine della frase. Questi mostrano che il riconoscimento delle entità può essere eseguito in questa configurazione e aprono lo sviluppo di altri strumenti NLP in una configurazione simile.", 'kk': 'Жазылған мәтіндегі аталған нысандарды анықтау - мәтін редакторының семантикалығын жақсы түсініп алу үшін қолданбаларда қолданылатын мәтін өңдеу құралының негізгі компоненті. Бірақ аталған нысандарды таңдау (NER) жүйелерін бағалау үшін тәжірибелі тәжірибелі мәтінді тексті уақытта өзгерту жүйелеріне тікелей қолданылмайды. Соңғы пайдаланушының мәліметті идентификаторлармен немесе сілтемелерімен бірге сілтемелерді келтіру үшін толық мәліметті келтіру үшін күту мүмкіндігін сұрау деңгейінде орындалады. Біз NER қолданбаларының романдық тәжірибелер жүйелерін таңдаймыз, онлайн тәртібімен аталған нысандар шектері туралы шешімдерді орындау керек. Біз осы орнатылған тілдерде күй- жай әдістер әдістерін зерттеп, осы моделдерге жаңа тәжірибелікті орнату үшін адаптацияларын ұсынамыз. Эксперименталдық нәтижелері барлық белгілерден кейін әрбір белгілерде бағалайтын жүйелердің ең жақсы нәтижелерін көрсетеді, сөйлеменің соңында бағалайтын жүйелердің 1- 5 F1 нәтижелеріне же Бұл құрылғылар бұл баптауда нысандарды анықтау және басқа NLP құрылғыларын ұқсас баптауда ашу мүмкіндігін көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'rašytiniame tekste nurodytų subjektų identifikavimas yra esminis teksto apdorojimo vamzdyno komponentas, naudojamas tokiose programose kaip teksto redaktoriai siekiant geriau suprasti teksto semantiką. Tačiau tipinė eksperimentinė įranga, skirta įvertinti pavadintų subjektų pripažinimo (NER) sistemas, tiesiogiai netaikoma sistemoms, kurios tvarko tekstą tikruoju laiku, kai tekstas rašomas. Vertinimas atliekamas sakinio lygiu, jei galutinis naudotojas yra pasirengęs laukti, kol bus užrašytas visas sakinys, kad subjektai būtų identifikuojami ir toliau susieti su identifikatoriais arba su bendra nuoroda. We introduce a novel experimental setup for NER systems for applications where decisions about named entity boundaries need to be performed in an online fashion.  Mes tiriame, kaip šiuolaikiniai metodai veikia įvairiomis kalbomis ir siūlome pritaikyti šiuos modelius, kad jie atitiktų naują eksperimentinę struktūrą. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad geriausios sistemos, įvertintos kiekviename ženkle po jo įrašymo, pasiekia veiksmingumą per 1–5 F1 taškus sistemų, įvertintų sakinio pabaigoje. Tai rodo, kad ūkio subjektų pripažinimas gali būti atliekamas šioje sistemoje ir atveria kitų NLP priemonių kūrimą panašioje sistemoje.', 'mk': 'Идентификувањето на именуваните ентитети во напишаниот текст е суштински компонент на гасоводот за процес на текст кој се користи во апликациите како што се текстовите уредници за подобро разбирање на семантиката на текстот. Сепак, типичната експериментална поставка за проценка на системите за препознавање на именувани ентитети (NER) не е директно применлива за системите кои процесираат текст во реално време додека се пишува текстот. Evaluation is performed on a sentence level assuming the end-user is willing to wait until the whole sentence is typed for entities to be identified and further linked to identifiers or co-referenced. Ние воведуваме ново експериментално поставување за НЕР системи за апликации каде одлуките за именуваните граници на ентитетите мора да се извршат на онлајн начин. Истражуваме како се одвиваат најновите методи под оваа поставка на повеќе јазици и предложуваме адаптации на овие модели за да се одговараат на оваа нова експериментална поставка. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека најдобрите системи кои се оценуваат на секој знак по неговото впишување, достигнуваат резултати во рамките на 1-5 Ф1 точки системи кои се оценуваат на крајот на реченицата. Овие покажуваат дека признавањето на ентитетите може да се изврши во ова поставување и да се отвори развојот на други NLP алатки во слична поставка.', 'ms': 'Mengenalpasti entiti bernama dalam teks tertulis adalah komponen penting bagi baris paip pemprosesan teks yang digunakan dalam aplikasi seperti editor teks untuk mendapatkan pemahaman yang lebih baik tentang semantik teks. Namun, tetapan eksperimen biasa untuk menilai sistem Pengenalan Entiti bernama (NER) tidak secara langsung berlaku kepada sistem yang memproses teks dalam masa sebenar kerana teks sedang ditaip. Evaluasi dilakukan pada tahap kalimat menganggap pengguna akhir bersedia menunggu sehingga seluruh kalimat ditaip untuk entiti untuk dikenalpasti dan berhubung lebih lanjut dengan pengenalpasti atau rujukan-sama. Kami memperkenalkan tetapan percubaan baru untuk sistem NER untuk aplikasi dimana keputusan mengenai sempadan entiti bernama perlu dilakukan secara online. Kami mempelajari bagaimana kaedah state-of-the-art berjalan di bawah seting ini dalam berbilang bahasa dan melamar penyesuaian kepada model ini untuk sesuai seting percubaan baru ini. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa sistem terbaik yang diteliti pada setiap token selepas ditaip, mencapai prestasi dalam 1–5 titik F1 sistem yang diteliti pada akhir kalimat. Ini menunjukkan pengenalan entiti boleh dilakukan dalam seting ini dan membuka pembangunan alat NLP lain dalam seting yang sama.', 'ml': 'എഴുതിയ വാചകത്തിലുള്ള പേരുള്ള വസ്തുക്കളെ തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d പദാവലി പ്രയോഗങ്ങളില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന പൈപ്പെലിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഘടക എന്നാലും പേരിട്ട എന്റിറ്റി തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനുള്ള സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200d നേരിട്ട് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റമില്ല. ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ടൈപ്പ അവസാനത്തെ ഉപയോക്താവ് കാത്തിരിക്കുന്നതിനായി മുഴുവന്\u200d വാക്ക് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനും കൂടുതല്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്ന വസ്തുക്കള്\u200dക്കും വേണ്ടി വാക പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുവേണ്ടി നെആര്\u200d സിസ്റ്റത്തിനുള്ള ഒരു നോവല്\u200d പരീക്ഷണത്തിനുള്ള പരീക്ഷണ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അവി ഈ ക്രമീകരണത്തിന്റെ കീഴില്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ് രാജ്യത്തിന്റെ രീതികള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നതെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. പല ഭാഷകളില്\u200d പ് പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു ഓരോ ചിഹ്നത്തിലും ഏറ്റവും നല്ല സിസ്റ്റമുണ്ട് അതിന്റെ ടൈപ്പ് ചെയ്തതിനു ശേഷം, വാക്കിന്റെ അവസാനത്തില്\u200d  ഈ സജ്ജീകരണത്തില്\u200d സാധ്യതയുടെ തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുകയും മറ്റു NLP ഉപകരണങ്ങളുടെ വികസിപ്പിനെ തുറക്കുകയും ചെയ്യ', 'mt': 'L-identifikazzjoni ta’ entitajiet imsemmija fit-test bil-miktub hija komponent essenzjali tal-pipeline tal-ipproċessar tat-test użat f’applikazzjonijiet bħall-edituri tat-test biex jinkiseb fehim a ħjar tas-semantika tat-test. Madankollu, l-istruttura sperimentali tipika għall-evalwazzjoni tas-sistemi tar-Rikonoxximent tal-Entità Ismija (NER) mhijiex direttament applikabbli għas-sistemi li jipproċessaw it-test f’ħin reali waqt li t-test ikun qed jitfassal. L-evalwazzjoni titwettaq fuq livell ta’ sentenza jekk l-utent finali jkun lest jistenna sakemm is-sentenza kollha tiġi ttippjata biex l-entitajiet jiġu identifikati u aktar marbuta mal-identifikaturi jew ko-referenzjati. Aħna nintroduċu struttura sperimentali ġdida għas-sistemi NER għall-applikazzjonijiet fejn id-deċiżjonijiet dwar il-fruntieri tal-entitajiet imsemmija jeħtieġu jitwettqu b’mod onlajn. Aħna nistudjaw kif il-metodi l-aktar avvanzati jitwettqu taħt dan it-twaqqif f’diversi lingwi u nipproponu adattamenti għal dawn il-mudelli biex jaqblu ma’ dan it-twaqqif esperimentali ġdid. Ir-riżultati esperimentali juru li l-aħjar sistemi li jiġu evalwati fuq kull token wara t-tipjip tiegħu, jilħqu l-prestazzjoni fi ħdan 1-5 punti F1 ta’ sistemi li jiġu evalwati fl-aħħar tas-sentenza. Dawn juru li r-rikonoxximent tal-entità jista’ jsir f’dan it-twaqqif u jiftaħ l-iżvilupp ta’ għodod oħra tal-NLP f’twaqqif simili.', 'mn': 'Бичсэн текст дээр нэрлэгдсэн элементүүдийг тодорхойлох нь текст загварын хэрэглэгдэх хоолойны чухал компонент юм. Гэхдээ нэрлэгдсэн Entity Recognition (NER) системийг шалгахын тулд жинхэнэ хугацаанд текст бичсэн системд шууд хэрэглэгддэггүй. Хэрэглэгч бүх өгүүлбэрийг тодорхойлох болон хоорондоо холбоотой хүмүүстэй холбоотой байх үед хүлээн зөвшөөрөх хүсэлтэй гэж бодож өгүүлбэрийн түвшинд үнэлгээ хийгддэг. Бид NER системийн шинжлэх ухааны шийдвэрлэлийг онлайн загвар дээр хийх хэрэгтэй. Бид олон хэл дээр урлагийн төлөө хэрхэн үйлдвэрлэхийг судалж, эдгээр загваруудыг шинэ туршилтын төлөвлөгөөнд адаптацийг санал болгож байна. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд хэвлэгдсэн дараа тэмдэглэгдсэн хамгийн шилдэг систем нь 1-5 F1 цэгийн доторх үйл ажиллагааг хүртэхийг харуулдаг. Эдгээр нь бизнесийн хүлээн зөвшөөрөл энэ бүтээгдэхүүн дээр хийж, өөр NLP хэрэгслүүдийн хөгжлийг төстэй байгуулалт нээлттэй болгож чадна.', 'no': 'Identifikasjon av namnet einingar i skriven tekst er ein viktig komponent av tekstbehandlingslinja som vert brukt i program som tekstredigeringar for å få bedre forståelse av semantikkane i teksten. Den typiske eksperimentelle oppsettet for å evaluera systema med namnet entitetskjenning (NER) er ikkje direkte tilgjengeleg for systema som prosesserer teksten i verkeleg tid sidan teksten vert skriven. Evalueringa vert utført på eit setningsnivå dersom sluttbrukaren er vilkårleg å venta til heile setninga vert skriven inn for å identifisera einingar og lenger knytta til identifikatorar eller samanlikna. Vi introduserer eit nytt eksperimentell oppsett for NER-systemet for program der beslutningar om namnet entitetsgrenser må utførast på eit nettverk måte. Vi studerer korleis kunstmetodar utfører under denne oppsettet i fleire språk og foreslår tilpassar til desse modelane for å passa til denne nye eksperimentelle oppsettet. Eksperimentale resultat viser at dei beste systema som skal evaluerast på kvar teikn etter skrivinga, når utviklinga innenfor 1–5 F1-punkt av systema som skal evaluerast på slutten av setninga. Desse viser at entitetskjenning kan utførast i denne oppsettet og opna utviklinga av andre NLP-verktøy i eit liknande oppsett.', 'pl': 'Identyfikacja nazwanych podmiotów w tekście pisanym jest niezbędnym elementem procesu przetwarzania tekstu stosowanego w aplikacjach takich jak edytory tekstu w celu lepszego zrozumienia semantyki tekstu. Jednak typowa konfiguracja eksperymentalna do oceny systemów NER (Named Entity Recognition) nie ma bezpośredniego zastosowania do systemów, które przetwarzają tekst w czasie rzeczywistym podczas wpisywania tekstu. Ocena przeprowadzana jest na poziomie zdania zakładając, że użytkownik końcowy jest gotów poczekać, aż całe zdanie zostanie wpisane, aby podmioty zostały zidentyfikowane i dalej powiązane z identyfikatorami lub współreferowane. Wprowadzamy nowatorską konfigurację eksperymentalną systemów NER dla aplikacji, w których decyzje o nazwanych granicach podmiotów muszą być wykonywane w sposób online. Badamy, jak działają najnowocześniejsze metody w tej konfiguracji w wielu językach i proponujemy dostosowania do tych modeli, aby pasować do nowej konfiguracji eksperymentalnej. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że najlepsze systemy, które są oceniane na każdym tokenie po jego wpisaniu, osiągają wydajność w ramach 1–5 punktów F1 systemów, które są oceniane na końcu zdania. Pokazują one, że rozpoznawanie jednostek może być wykonywane w tej konfiguracji i otwierają rozwój innych narzędzi NLP w podobnej konfiguracji.', 'ro': 'Identificarea entităților numite în textul scris este o componentă esențială a conductei de procesare a textului utilizate în aplicații precum editorii de text pentru a obține o mai bună înțelegere a semanticii textului. Cu toate acestea, configurația experimentală tipică pentru evaluarea sistemelor de recunoaștere a entităților denumite (NER) nu este direct aplicabilă sistemelor care procesează textul în timp real pe măsură ce textul este tastat. Evaluarea se efectuează la nivel de propoziție presupunând că utilizatorul final este dispus să aștepte până când întreaga propoziție este tastată pentru ca entitățile să fie identificate și conectate în continuare la identificatori sau co-referințe. Introducem o nouă configurație experimentală pentru sistemele NER pentru aplicații în care deciziile privind limitele entităților numite trebuie efectuate într-un mod online. Studiem modul în care funcționează metodele de ultimă generație în cadrul acestei setări în mai multe limbi și propunem adaptări la aceste modele pentru a se potrivi acestei noi setări experimentale. Rezultatele experimentale arată că cele mai bune sisteme care sunt evaluate pe fiecare token după tastare, ating performanța în 1-5 puncte F1 de sisteme care sunt evaluate la sfârșitul propoziției. Acestea arată că recunoașterea entităților poate fi efectuată în această configurație și deschide dezvoltarea altor instrumente NLP într-o configurație similară.', 'sr': 'Identifikacija imenovanih entitata u pisanom tekstu je ključna komponenta teksta koji obrađuje cijev korištenog u aplikacijama kao što su editori teksta kako bi dobili bolje razumijevanje semantika teksta. Međutim, tipični eksperimentalni nastup za procjenu sistema priznanja imenovanih entiteta (NER) nije direktno primjenjivan na sisteme koji procesuju tekst u pravo vrijeme dok se tekst piše. Evaluacija je provedena na nivou rečenice, pretpostavljajući da je konačni korisnik spreman čekati dok se cijela rečenica ne upiše kako bi entiteti identifikovane i dalje povezani sa identifikatorima ili spojenom. Predstavljamo novu eksperimentalnu postavku za sisteme NER-a za aplikacije gde moraju da se odluke o granicama imenovanih entitata provede na internetskom načinu. Proučavamo kako stanje umjetnosti izvode pod ovim uspostavljanjem na višestrukim jezicima i predlažemo prilagodbe ovim modelima kako bi odgovarali ovom novom eksperimentalnom uspostavljanju. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da najbolji sistem koji se procjenjuju na svakom znaku nakon pisanja, dođe do učinka unutar 1-5 F1 bodova sistema koji se procjenjuju na kraju rečenice. Ovi pokazuju da se prepoznavanje entiteta može izvršiti u ovom uspostavu i otvoriti razvoj drugih NLP alata u sličnom uspostavu.', 'so': "Aqoonsashada macluumaadka la magacaabay qoraalka waa qayb muhiim ah oo ka mid ah baaritaanka baaraandegista qoraalka ee lagu isticmaalayo codsiga, tusaale ahaan edriinka qoraalka si aad u hesho waxgarashada saxda qoraalka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qoraalka imtixaanka ee caadiga ah ee lagu qiimeeyo nidaamka aqoonsiga ganacsiga (NER) si toos ah uma habboona nidaamka ku baaraandegaya qoraalka si dhab ah marka qoraalka lagu qorayo. Qiimeynta waxaa lagu sameeyaa heerka ereyga, kaasi oo uu isticmaalaha dhamaadka ah raadsan yahay inuu sugo ilaa uu dhamaan erayga lagu qoro waxyaabaha la aqoonsan karo oo la xiriiri karo aqoonsiga ama la isku xiriiri karo. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qoraal tijaab ah oo lagu sameynayo nidaamka NER, kaas oo lagu baahan yahay go'aanka la magacaabay xuduudaha entity in lagu sameeyo qaab internetka ah. Waxaynu baranaynaa siduu u sameeyo qaababka farshaxanka ah oo ku qoran qaababkan oo ku qoran luuqadaha kala duduwan, waxaana soo jeedinaynaa in loo beddelo tusaalahan si ay u habboonaato qaababkan tijaabada cusub. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in nidaamka ugu wanaagsan ee lagu qiimeeyo calaamad kasta kadib, uu dhamaadka nidaamka lagu qiimeeyo 1-5 F1. Kuwan waxay muujin karaan in aqoonsashada aqoonsiga entities lagu sameyn karo qoraalkaas oo uu u furi karo horumarinta qalabka kale ee NLP si lamid ah.", 'sv': 'Identifiering av namngivna entiteter i skriftlig text är en viktig komponent i den textbehandlingspipeline som används i applikationer som textredigerare för att få en bättre förståelse för textens semantik. Den typiska experimentella inställningen för utvärdering av NER-system (Named Entity Recognition) är dock inte direkt tillämplig på system som bearbetar text i realtid när texten skrivs. Utvärderingen utförs på meningsnivå under förutsättning att slutanvändaren är villig att vänta tills hela meningen skrivs in för att enheter ska identifieras och vidare länkas till identifierare eller samrefereras. Vi introducerar en ny experimentell setup för NER-system för applikationer där beslut om namngivna entitetsgränser måste utföras på ett online sätt. Vi studerar hur state-of-the-art metoder presterar under denna konfiguration på flera språk och föreslår anpassningar till dessa modeller för att passa denna nya experimentella konfiguration. Experimentella resultat visar att de bästa systemen som utvärderas på varje token efter att den skrivits, når prestanda inom 1–5 F1 poäng av system som utvärderas i slutet av meningen. Dessa visar att entitetsigenkänning kan utföras i den här konfigurationen och öppna upp utvecklingen av andra NLP-verktyg i en liknande konfiguration.', 'ta': 'எழுத்து உரையில் பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள்களை அடையாளம் என்பது உரை செயல்படுத்தும் பைப்லைனின் முக்கியமான பகுதி ஆனால், பெயரிடப்பட்ட பெயர் உள்ளீடு அறிவு (NER) அமைப்புகளை மதிப்பிடுவதற்கான இயல்பான சோதனையான அமைப்பு உரை உள்ளிடும் போது உரையை நேரத்தில் செயல்படு முழு வாக்கியத்தை அடையாளப்படுத்தும் பொருட்களுக்கு மேலும் இணைக்கப்பட்டுள்ள அடையாளங்கள் அல்லது இணைப்பு கொண்டு உள்ளிடும் வரை முடியும் என்ற We introduce a novel experimental setup for NER systems for applications where decisions about named entity boundaries need to be performed in an online fashion.  நாங்கள் இந்த அமைப்பின் நிலை-கலை முறைமைகள் பல மொழிகளில் எப்படி செயல்படுத்துகிறது என்பதை படிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் இந்த புதிய சோதனையின முயற்சி முடிவுகள் ஒவ்வொரு குறியீட்டிற்குப் பிறகு மதிப்பிடப்படும் சிறந்த அமைப்புகளை காட்டுகிறது, வாக்கியத்தின் முடிவில் மதிப்பிடப்படு இந்த காட்சியில் பொருள் அடையாளம் இந்த அமைப்பில் செயல்படுத்த முடியும் மற்ற NLP கருவிகள் உருவாக்கத்தை திறக்க முடியு', 'si': 'ලියපු පාළුවේ නම් නම් අයිති අයිතිකරණය පරික්ෂණ පායිප්ලින් වල භාවිත වෙන්න පාළුවන්ගේ අයිතිකරණය සඳහා පාළුවන් ස නමුත්, නම් අයිති අයිතිරීක්ෂණය (NER) පද්ධතියට පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය පරීක්ෂණ සැකසුම් ස්ථානය සඳහා පද්ධතිය සඳහා පාළ අවසානය සම්පූර්ණ වාක්ෂාවක් ලිපිනකම් වාක්ෂාව සඳහා අවසානය සඳහා සම්පූර්ණ සඳහා සම්පූර්ණ සඳහා සම්පූර්ණ සඳහා සම් අපි NER පද්ධතිය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් සැකසුම් කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් තියාගන්නවා කියලා, නම් නම් පද්ධතිය සීම අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා කොහොමද මේ සැකසුම් භාෂාවල් වලින් කොහොමද කියලා, මේ මොඩේල්ස් වලට අලුත් පරීක්ෂණ සැකසුම් වල පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ හැම ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙක්ම විශ්වාස කරපු හොඳම පද්ධතිය, ප්\u200dරතිචාරයේ අවසානයේ ප මේවා පෙන්වන්නේ අයිති අඳුරගන්න පුළුවන් මේ සැකසුමේදී වැඩ කරන්න සහ අනිත් NLP උපකරණ සැකසුමේදී විකාශය', 'ur': 'لکھی ہوئی پیغام میں نام کے نام کے اختیاروں کا شناسایا کرنا ایک ضروری رقم ہے جو پیغام میں استعمال ہونے والی پیغمبروں میں استعمال کی جاتی ہے جیسے پیغام سمانٹر کے لئے پیغام کے سیمانٹیکوں کے بہتر سمجھنے کے لئے۔ However, the typical experimental setup for evaluating Named Entity Recognition (NER) systems is not directly applicable to systems that process text in real time as the text is typed. انتظام ایک جماعت سطح پر عمل کی جاتی ہے کہ آخر کارساز انتظار کرنا چاہتا ہے یہاں تک کہ تمام جماعت کو پہچان لینے کے لئے تایپ کر دی جاتی ہے اور پہچان کرنے والوں یا مشترک ارتباط کے ساتھ اضافہ کیا جاتا ہے. ہم نے NER سیستموں کے لئے ایک نئی آزمائش سٹاپ کو معلوم کیا ہے جہاں انٹیٹی حدود کے بارے میں فیصلہ کرنے کی ضرورت ہے ایک آنلاین طریقے سے۔ ہم پڑھتے ہیں کہ اس سٹاپ کے اندر کئی زیادہ زبانوں کے ساتھ کیسا استٹ-آئٹ روش کرتے ہیں اور ان نمڈلوں کے ساتھ اس نئی آزمائش سٹاپ کے مطابق اضافہ کریں۔ آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہر ٹوکنے کے بعد سب سے بہترین سیستموں کا ارزش کیا جاتا ہے، 1-5 F1 پوینٹوں کے اندر فعالیت پہنچ جاتا ہے جو فیصلہ کے آخر میں ارزش کیا جاتا ہے. یہ دکھاتے ہیں کہ انٹیٹی کی شناسایی اس سٹاپ میں انجام دی جاتی ہے اور ایک جیسی سٹاپ میں دوسرے NLP ابزار کی توسعہ کھول دیتی ہے.', 'uz': "Name @ info: whatsthis @ info: whatsthis Biz NER tizimlari uchun novel taʼminlovchi tizimni koʻrsatimiz. Bu yerda obʼekt chegaralari haqida taʼminlov qilinadigan xususiyatlarni online usulda bajarish kerak. Biz bu tugmalar bir necha tillarda qanday o'rnatish holat usullarini o'rganamiz va bu yangi tizim tugmasini moslash uchun o'xshash modellarni o'rganamiz. Tajriba natijalari, har bir tugmadan keyin eng yaxshi tizimlarda qiymatlash mumkin, gapiring oxirida qiymatda 1- 5 F1 pochta tizimga bajarish. These show that entity recognition can be performed in this setup and open up the development of other NLP tools in a similar setup.", 'vi': 'Nhận dạng các thực thể tên trong văn bản là một phần thiết yếu trong đường ống xử lý văn bản được sử dụng trong các ứng dụng như các biên tập viên văn bản để hiểu rõ mọi thứ về ngữ pháp của văn bản. Tuy nhiên, thiết lập thử nghiệm điển hình để đánh giá hệ thống nhận dạng cấu trúc có tên (NER) không trực tiếp áp dụng cho hệ thống xử lý văn bản trong thời gian thực khi đoạn được gõ. Bài đánh giá được thực hiện ở mức độ một câu, giả sử người dùng cuối sẵn sàng chờ đến khi câu to àn bộ câu được gõ để thực thể được xác định và nối thêm với các bộ nhận diện nhận diện hoặc tham khảo. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một thiết lập thử nghiệm mới cho các ứng dụng nằm trong đó các quyết định về ranh giới thực thể được đặt tên cần được thực hiện trực tuyến. Chúng tôi nghiên cứu cách thức thức hoạt động của các phương pháp hiện đại dưới sự thiết lập này bằng nhiều ngôn ngữ và đề nghị sửa đổi các mô hình này phù hợp với thiết lập thử nghiệm mới. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy những hệ thống tốt nhất được đánh giá trên mỗi vật thể sau khi nó được đánh máy, đạt đến hiệu suất trong vòng 1\\ 8115 F1 các điểm hệ thống được đánh giá ở cuối câu. Những thứ này cho thấy khả năng nhận dạng thực thể được thực hiện trong thiết lập này và mở rộng khả năng phát triển các công cụ khác trong thiết lập tương tự.', 'bg': 'Идентифицирането на имената в писмен текст е съществен компонент на текстообработващия тръбопровод, използван в приложения като текстови редактори, за да се получи по-добро разбиране на семантиката на текста. Въпреки това, типичната експериментална настройка за оценка на системите за разпознаване на имена на субекти (НЕР) не е пряко приложима за системи, които обработват текст в реално време, докато текстът се въвежда. Оценката се извършва на ниво изречение, като се предполага, че крайният потребител е готов да изчака, докато цялото изречение бъде въведено, за да бъдат идентифицирани и допълнително свързани с идентификатори или съпътстващи препратки. Въвеждаме нова експериментална настройка за системи за приложения, където решенията за границите на дадените обекти трябва да се извършват онлайн. Изследваме как съвременните методи работят при тази настройка на няколко езика и предлагаме адаптации към тези модели, за да отговарят на тази нова експериментална настройка. Експерименталните резултати показват, че най-добрите системи, които се оценяват на всеки символ след неговото въвеждане, достигат производителност в рамките на 1-5 точки от системите, които се оценяват в края на изречението. Те показват, че разпознаването на обекти може да се извърши в тази настройка и отваря развитието на други инструменти за НЛП в подобна настройка.', 'nl': 'Het identificeren van benoemde entiteiten in geschreven tekst is een essentieel onderdeel van de tekstverwerkingspijplijn die wordt gebruikt in toepassingen zoals teksteditors om een beter begrip van de semantiek van de tekst te krijgen. De typische experimentele opstelling voor het evalueren van NER-systemen (Named Entity Recognition) is echter niet direct van toepassing op systemen die tekst in realtime verwerken terwijl de tekst wordt getypt. De evaluatie wordt uitgevoerd op zinsniveau, ervan uitgaande dat de eindgebruiker bereid is te wachten tot de hele zin is getypt om entiteiten te identificeren en verder te koppelen aan identificators of co-references. We introduceren een nieuwe experimentele opstelling voor NER-systemen voor toepassingen waar beslissingen over benoemde entiteitsgrenzen online moeten worden uitgevoerd. We bestuderen hoe state-of-the-art methoden presteren onder deze opstelling in meerdere talen en stellen aanpassingen voor aan deze modellen om aan deze nieuwe experimentele opstelling te voldoen. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat de beste systemen die worden geëvalueerd op elk token na het typen, prestaties bereiken binnen 1-5 F1 punten van systemen die worden geëvalueerd aan het einde van de zin. Deze tonen aan dat entiteitsherkenning kan worden uitgevoerd in deze setup en openen de ontwikkeling van andere NLP tools in een soortgelijke setup.', 'da': 'Identificering af navngivne entiteter i skriftlig tekst er en væsentlig komponent i tekstbehandlingsprørledningen, der anvendes i applikationer som teksteditorer for at få en bedre forståelse af tekstens semantik. Den typiske eksperimentelle opsætning til evaluering af NER-systemer (Named Entity Recognition) finder imidlertid ikke direkte anvendelse på systemer, der behandler tekst i realtid, mens teksten skrives. Evalueringen udføres på et sætningsniveau, hvis slutbrugeren er villig til at vente, indtil hele sætningen er skrevet, for enheder skal identificeres og yderligere knyttes til identifikatorer eller sammenhænge. Vi introducerer en ny eksperimentel setup for NER systemer til applikationer, hvor beslutninger om navngivne entitetsgrænser skal udføres på en online måde. Vi undersøger, hvordan state-of-the-art metoder fungerer under denne opsætning på flere sprog og foreslår tilpasninger til disse modeller, der passer til denne nye eksperimentelle opsætning. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at de bedste systemer, der evalueres på hvert token efter dens indtastning, når ydeevne inden for 1-5 F1 point af systemer, der evalueres i slutningen af sætningen. Disse viser, at enhedsgenkendelse kan udføres i denne opsætning og åbner op for udviklingen af andre NLP-værktøjer i en lignende opsætning.', 'id': 'Identifikasi entitas bernama dalam teks tertulis adalah komponen penting dari pipeline proses teks yang digunakan dalam aplikasi seperti editor teks untuk mendapatkan pemahaman yang lebih baik dari semantik teks. Namun, seting eksperimen tipis untuk mengevaluasi sistem Pengenalan Entitas bernama (NER) tidak secara langsung berlaku pada sistem yang memproses teks dalam waktu nyata saat teks sedang ditaip. Evaluasi dilakukan pada tingkat kalimat asumsikan pengguna akhir bersedia menunggu sampai seluruh kalimat ditaip untuk entitas untuk dikenal dan lebih terhubung dengan pengenal atau koreferensi. Kami memperkenalkan seting eksperimen baru untuk sistem NER untuk aplikasi dimana keputusan tentang batas entitas bernama perlu dilakukan secara online. We study how state-of-the-art methods perform under this setup in multiple languages and propose adaptations to these models to suit this new experimental setup.  Experimental results show that the best systems that are evaluated on each token after its typed, reach performance within 1-5 F1 points of systems that are evaluated at the end of the sentence.  Ini menunjukkan bahwa pengakuan entitas dapat dilakukan dalam pengaturan ini dan membuka pengembangan alat NLP lainnya dalam pengaturan yang sama.', 'de': 'Die Identifizierung benannter Entitäten im geschriebenen Text ist ein wesentlicher Bestandteil der Textverarbeitungs-Pipeline, die in Anwendungen wie Texteditoren verwendet wird, um ein besseres Verständnis der Semantik des Textes zu erhalten. Der typische Versuchsaufbau zur Auswertung von NER-Systemen (Named Entity Recognition) ist jedoch nicht direkt auf Systeme anwendbar, die Text in Echtzeit verarbeiten, während der Text eingegeben wird. Die Auswertung erfolgt auf Satzebene unter der Annahme, dass der Endbenutzer bereit ist, zu warten, bis der gesamte Satz getippt wird, damit Entitäten identifiziert und weiter mit Identifikatoren verknüpft oder referenziert werden. Wir stellen einen neuartigen Versuchsaufbau für NER-Systeme für Anwendungen vor, bei denen Entscheidungen über benannte Entitätengrenzen online durchgeführt werden müssen. Wir untersuchen, wie moderne Methoden unter diesem Setup in mehreren Sprachen funktionieren und schlagen Anpassungen an diese Modelle vor, um diesem neuen Versuchsaufbau gerecht zu werden. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die besten Systeme, die auf jedem Token nach der Eingabe ausgewertet werden, Leistung innerhalb von 1-5 F1 Punkten von Systemen erreichen, die am Ende des Satzes ausgewertet werden. Diese zeigen, dass Entitätenerkennung in diesem Setup durchgeführt werden kann und eröffnen die Entwicklung anderer NLP-Tools in einem ähnlichen Setup.', 'hr': 'Identifikacija imenovanih entitata u pisanom tekstu je ključna komponenta cjevovoda koji se koristi u aplikacijama poput editora teksta kako bi dobili bolje razumijevanje semantika teksta. Međutim, tipični eksperimentalni uspostav za procjenu sustava priznanja imenovanih entiteta (NER) nije direktno primjenjivan na sustave koji procesiraju tekst u pravo vrijeme dok se tekst pisa. Procjenjivanje se provede na razini rečenice s pretpostavkom da je konačni korisnik spreman čekati dok cijela rečenica ne bude pisana kako bi se entiteti identificirali i dalje povezani s identifikatorima ili istoreferencijom. Predstavljamo novu eksperimentalnu postavku za NER sustave za aplikacije gdje se moraju provesti odluke o granicama imenovanih entitata na internetskom načinu. Proučavamo kako stanje umjetnosti izvode pod ovim uspostavljanjem na višestrukim jezicima i predlažemo prilagodbe ovim modelima kako bi odgovarali ovom novom eksperimentalnom uspostavljanju. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da najbolji sustavi koji se procjenjuju na svakom znaku nakon pisanja, postignu učinkovitost unutar 1-5 F1 bodova sustava koji se procjenjuju na kraju rečenice. Ovi pokazuju da se prepoznavanje entiteta može provesti u ovom uspostavu i otvoriti razvoj drugih NLP alata u sličnom uspostavu.', 'fa': 'شناسایی واحدهای نامیده در متن نوشته یک بخش اصلی از لوله\u200cهای پردازش متن که در کاربردهای مانند ویرایشگران متن استفاده می\u200cشود برای فهمیدن بهتر از سیمانتیک متن است. ولی، تنظیمات آزمایشی معمولی برای ارزیابی سیستم شناسایی عنوان واحد نامیده (NER) مستقیماً برای سیستم\u200cهایی که متن را در زمان واقعی فرایند می\u200cکند، قابل کاری نیست. ارزیابی در سطح جمله انجام می\u200cشود با فرض اینکه کاربر پایان حاضر است منتظر بماند تا کل جمله برای شناسایی و ارتباط بیشتر با شناسایی\u200cکنندگان یا همراه ارتباط نوشته شود. ما یک تنظیم آزمایشی روانی برای سیستم\u200cهای NER برای کاربردها معرفی می\u200cکنیم که تصمیم\u200cگیری در مورد محدوده\u200cهای نامیده شده\u200cای باید در یک طریق آنلاین انجام شود. ما مطالعه می\u200cکنیم که چگونه روش\u200cهای وضعیت هنری تحت این تنظیم در زبان\u200cهای متعدد انجام می\u200cدهند و پیشنهاد دادن به این مدل\u200cها برای این تنظیم آزمایشی جدید را می\u200cدهیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که بهترین سیستم\u200cهایی که بعد از نوشته\u200cاش روی هر نشانه ارزیابی می\u200cشوند، به عملکرد در ۱-۵ نقطه\u200cهای F1 سیستم\u200cهایی که در پایان جمله ارزیابی می\u200cشوند رسیده می\u200cشوند. این نشان می دهند که شناسایی واحد در این ساختمان می تواند انجام شود و توسعه ابزارهای دیگر NLP را در یک ساختمان مشابه باز کند.', 'sw': 'Kutambua vifaa vinavyoitwa katika maandishi ya kuandika ni sehemu ya muhimu ya mfumo wa utaratibu wa maandishi uliotumiwa katika matumizi kama vile wahariri wa maandishi ili kupata uelewa mzuri wa mipango ya maandishi. However, the typical experimental setup for evaluating Named Entity Recognition (NER) systems is not directly applicable to systems that process text in real time as the text is being typed.  Uchunguzi unafanyika katika kiwango cha hukumu kwa kudhani mtumiaji wa mwisho yuko tayari kusubiri mpaka hukumu yote itakapoandikwa kwa ajili ya vitu vinavyotambuliwa na vinginevyo vinavyohusiana na watambulishaji au yanayohusiana kwa pamoja. Tunaonyesha seti ya majaribio ya riwaya kwa mifumo ya NEW kwa ajili ya matumizi ambayo maamuzi yanayohusu mipaka ya entity yanapaswa kutekelezwa kwa njia ya mtandaoni. Tunajoma namna mbinu za hali ya sanaa zinavyofanya chini ya taasisi hii kwa lugha mbalimbali na tunapendekeza mabadiliko kwa mifano hii ili kuunganisha mpango huu mpya wa majaribio. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mifumo bora zaidi yanayopitiwa kwa kila alama baada ya kuandikwa, hufikia utendaji ndani ya pointi 1-5 F1 za mfumo unaotathmini mwishoni wa hukumu hiyo. Hii inaonyesha kwamba kutambua taasisi hii inaweza kutekelezwa na kufungua maendeleo ya zana nyingine za NLP katika seti kama hiyo.', 'ko': '서면 텍스트의 명칭 실체를 식별하는 것은 텍스트 처리 파이프의 중요한 구성 부분으로 텍스트 편집기 등 응용 프로그램에 사용되어 텍스트의 의미를 더욱 잘 이해할 수 있다.그러나 명명된 엔티티 인식(NER) 시스템을 평가하는 데 사용되는 일반적인 실험 장치는 텍스트를 입력할 때 실시간으로 텍스트를 처리하는 시스템에는 직접적으로 적용되지 않는다.만약에 최종 사용자가 전체 문장이 입력되어 실체를 식별하고 표지부호나 공동 인용에 연결되기를 기다리고 싶다면 문장 차원에서 평가를 실시한다.명명된 실체 경계 결정을 온라인으로 수행해야 하는 응용에 사용되는 새로운 NER 시스템 실험 장치를 소개했다.우리는 이러한 설정에서 다양한 언어에서 어떻게 집행되는지 가장 선진적인 방법을 연구했고 이러한 모델을 조정하여 이런 새로운 실험 설정에 적응하도록 건의했다.실험 결과 각 태그를 입력한 후 이를 평가하는 가장 좋은 시스템은 문장 끝에 평가된 시스템의 1-5개 F1점에서 성능에 도달한 것으로 나타났다.이는 엔티티 인식이 이 설정에서 수행되고 비슷한 설정에서 다른 NLP 도구를 개발할 수 있음을 나타냅니다.', 'tr': 'Edilen metin i챌inde adlanm캇힊 zatlary tanamak 체챌in i힊len첵채n metin i힊le첵채n pipelini흫 esasy komponenti. 횦철ne Adlann Entity Tanyjy (NER) sistemleri 체챌in adaty denetim sistemleri hatda metin 첵azmak 체챌in ullan첵ar. Ullan챌y 체챌in bir s철zlem derejesinde 챌ykyl첵ar we bellenenler 첵ada synany힊dyrylar 체챌in bu첵ruk girmek isle첵채ndigini ynan첵arlar. Biz NER sistemalary 체챌in bir nusga 챌yky힊lygyny tany힊dyr첵arys. Ady 챌yky힊lygyny barada karar bermeli. Biz bu d체z체mler altynda n채hili m철h체m surat metodlaryny 철wred첵채ris we bu nusgalara t채ze bir deneysel d체z체mlere uygun 힊ekilde 체첵tgetmegi teklip ed첵채ris. Testler netijesi, her token bilen 첵azylan i흫 gowy sistemalary흫 1-5 F1 noktalarynda 챌ykyl첵an sistemalary흫 so흫unda de흫le첵채r. Bu 첵erler birn채챌e tanamak 체챌in bu d체z체mlerde etm채ge ba힊ga NLP gurallaryny흫 geli힊mesini 첵aly bir d체z체mlerde a 챌ylyp biler.', 'af': "Identifikasie genaamde entiteite in skryfte teks is 'n nuwe komponent van die teks verwerking pyplyn gebruik in programme soos teks redigeerders om 'n beter verstanding van die semantieke van die teks te kry. Maar die tipiese eksperimentale opstelling vir evaluering van genoem eenheid herkenning (NER) stelsels is nie direk toewenbaar na stelsels wat proses teks in reël tyd as die teks is ingetik. Evaluasie word uitgevoer op 'n setvlak aanvaar dat die einde- gebruiker willig is om te wag totdat die hele seting ingetik word vir entiteite om identifiseer te word en verdere verbind aan identifiseerders of saamverwysing te word. Ons introduseer 'n roman eksperimentale opstelling vir NER stelsels vir toepassings waar besluite oor genoem entiteitgrense moet in 'n onlinemodus uitgevoer word. Ons studeer hoe state-of-the-art metodes onder hierdie opstelling in veelvuldige tale uitvoer en voorstel aanpassings aan hierdie modele om hierdie nuwe eksperimentale opstelling te pas. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat die beste stelsels wat op elke token geevalueer word na sy tipe, bereik prestasie binne 1- 5 F1 punte van stelsels wat na die einde van die seting geevalueer word. Hierdie wys dat entiteiterkenning in hierdie opstelling kan uitgevoer word en die ontwikkeling van ander NLP nutsprogramme in 'n gelyklike opstelling oop word.", 'sq': 'Identifikimi i njësive të emëruara në tekst të shkruar është një komponent thelbësor i tubacionit të procesimit të tekstit të përdorur në aplikacione të tilla si redaktorët e tekstit për të fituar një kuptim më të mirë të semantikës së tekstit. Megjithatë, konfigurimi tipik eksperimental për vlerësimin e sistemeve të njohjes së emëruar të njësisë (NER) nuk është drejtpërdrejt i aplikueshëm ndaj sistemeve që procesojnë tekstin në kohë reale ndërsa teksti është shkruar. Vlerësimi kryehet në një nivel fjalimi duke supozuar se përdoruesi përfundimtar është i gatshëm të presë deri sa të gjithë fjalimi të shkruhet për njësitë që të identifikohen dhe të lidhen më tej me identifikuesit apo bashkëreferencimin. We introduce a novel experimental setup for NER systems for applications where decisions about named entity boundaries need to be performed in an online fashion.  Ne studiojmë se si metodat e moderne funksionojnë nën këtë sistem në gjuhë të shumta dhe propozojmë përshtatje në këto modele për të përshtatur këtë sistem të ri eksperimental. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se sistemet më të mira që vlerësohen në çdo shenjë pas shkrimit të saj, arrijnë performancën brenda 1-5 pikave F1 të sistemeve që vlerësohen në fund të fjalës. These show that entity recognition can be performed in this setup and open up the development of other NLP tools in a similar setup.', 'bn': 'লিখিত লেখায় নামের বৈশিষ্ট্য সনাক্ত করা হচ্ছে টেক্সট প্রক্রিয়া পাইপেলেনের একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ অংশ, যেমন লেখা সম্পাদকদের লেখার সেমে তবে নামের এন্টিটি স্বীকৃতির (NER) সিস্টেম মূল্যায়নের জন্য সাধারণ পরীক্ষার বৈশিষ্ট্যের ব্যবস্থা সরাসরি প্রয়োজন নেই যে সিস্টেমে প্রক্র শেষ ব্যবহারকারীরা অপেক্ষা করতে পারেন যে পর্যন্ত পুরো বাক্য চিহ্নিত এবং পরিচিতির সাথে আরো সংযুক্ত হওয়া বস্তুর জন্য লিখে দেওয়া হবে পর্যন্ত না পুরো বা আমরা একটি নোভেল পরীক্ষার সিস্টেমের জন্য একটি পরীক্ষা ব্যবস্থা চিহ্নিত করেছি যেখানে প্রাপ্ত অ্যাপলিকেশনের জন্য নামের সীমানা ন আমরা শিক্ষা করছি কিভাবে রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের পদ্ধতি বিভিন্ন ভাষায় এই বিন্যাসের অধীনে কাজ করে এবং এই নতুন পরীক্ষার স্থানের মুক্ পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্রত্যেকটি চিহ্নের মধ্যে সবচেয়ে ভালো সিস্টেমের মূল্যায়ন করা হয়েছে, যারা এই বাক্যের শেষ পর্যন্ত মূল্যায়ন করা হয়ে এগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে এই বিন্যাসে বস্তুর স্বীকৃতি প্রদর্শন করা যাবে এবং একই ধরনের বিন্যাসে অন্যান্য এনএলপি টুলের উন্নয়ন', 'am': "በጽሑፍ ጽሑፍ ውስጥ የተባለው አካላትን ለማስታወቅ የጽሑፍ ማቀናጃ ፕሮግራሞች ውስጥ በተጠቃሚ የጽሑፍ ማቀናጃ የተጠቃሚ ክፍል ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን ጽሑፉ እንደተጻፈ ጽሑፉን በሚያስተካክሉ ስርዓት (NER) ስርዓቶች ጽሑፉን በሚያስተካክሉ ስርዓቶች በቀጥታ አይጠቅሙም፡፡ ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s የአካባቢው ዳርቻ በይነመረብ በመስመር ማድረግ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ የ-የ-አርእስት ሥርዓቶች እንዴት እንደተፈጸሙ እናስተምራለን፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች ከሁሉም ምልክቶች በኋላ የተመሠረቱት ትልቁ ስርዓቶች፣ በፍርዱ መጨረሻ በሚያስተምሩ 1-5 F1 ነጥብ ውስጥ የስርዓት ውጤት እንዲደርሱ ያሳያል፡፡ እነዚህ የሚያሳዩ አካባቢው ማውቀት በተደረገው ውስጥ እንዲፈጸም እና ሌሎችን የNLP መሣሪያዎችን በመክፈት በሚመስል በክፈት ውስጥ እንዲከፍት ይችላል፡፡", 'bs': 'Identifikacija imenovanih entitata u pisanom tekstu je ključna komponenta proizvodnje cijevi teksta koji se koristi u aplikacijama poput editora teksta kako bi dobili bolje razumijevanje semantika teksta. Međutim, tipični eksperimentalni uspostav za procjenu sustava priznanja imenovanih entiteta (NER) nije direktno primjenjivan na sisteme koji procesuju tekst u pravo vrijeme dok se tekst pisa. Evaluacija se izvršava na razini rečenice s pretpostavkom da je konačni korisnik spreman čekati dok cijela rečenica ne bude pisana kako bi se entiteti identifikovali i dalje povezani s identifikatorima ili spojenom. Predstavljamo novu eksperimentalnu postavku za NER sisteme za aplikacije gdje odluke o granicama imenovanih entitata moraju biti provedena na internetskom načinu. Proučavamo kako stanje umjetnosti izvode pod ovim uspostavljanjem na višestrukim jezicima i predlažemo prilagodbe ovim modelima kako bi odgovarali ovom novom eksperimentalnom uspostavljanju. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da najbolji sistem koji se procjenjuju na svakom znaku nakon pisanja, dođe do učinka unutar 1-5 F1 bodova sustava koji se procjenjuju na kraju rečenice. Ovi pokazuju da se prepoznavanje entiteta može izvršiti u ovom uspostavu i otvoriti razvoj drugih NLP alata u sličnom uspostavu.', 'az': 'Yazı mətndə adlı nöqtələri təsdiqləmək mətn sistemlərində istifadə edilən mətn mətni təsdiqləməsi üçün daha yaxşı mətn semantikalarını anlamaq üçün istifadə edilən mətn mətni mətni tədriclərinin əsas komponenti. Lakin Adlı Entity Recognition (NER) sistemlərini değerləşdirmək üçün növbənöv təcrübə qurulması, məktub yazıldığı kimi məktub işlədən sistemlərə doğrudan uyğun deyildir. Qıymet səviyyəsində təmin edilir ki, sonun istifadəçisinin bütün cümlənin tanıdılması və daha çox kimlikləşdirilməsi üçün yazılması üçün təmin edilənə qədər gözləmək istəyir. Biz NER sistemləri üçün yeni bir təcrübə qurğunu tanıdırırıq ki, adlı entitə sınırları barəsindəki kararlar onlaynı moda gerçəklənmək lazımdır. Biz bu quruluş altında növbəti dillərdə müxtəlif tərzlərin necə işlədiklərini öyrənirik və bu modellərə yeni təcrübə qurulması üçün uyğunlaşdırmaları təklif edirik. Müxtəlif sonuçları, yazıldığından sonra hər token üzərində değerlendirilən ən yaxşı sistemlərin 1-5 F1 noktalarının sonunda değerlendirilən sistemlərin performansına çatdığını göstərir. Bunlar, bu quruluş içində entitə tanıması işlədilir və bənzər bir quruluş içində başqa NLP vasitələrinin inkişafını a çar.', 'hy': 'Գրված տեքստում գտնվող անվանումների հայտնաբերումը տեքստի խողովակաշարի կարևոր բաղադրիչ է, որը օգտագործվում է այնպիսի ծրագրերում, ինչպիսիք են տեքստի խմբագրողները, տեքստի սեմանտիկայի ավելի լավ հասկանալու համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, նշված անհատականության հայտնաբերման (ՆԵՌ) համակարգերի գնահատման տիպիկ փորձարկման կառուցվածքը անմիջապես չի օգտագործվում համակարգերի համար, որոնք գործում են տեքստը իրական ժամանակում, երբ տեքստը գրվում է: Արժեքը կատարվում է նախադասության մակարդակում, ենթադրելով, որ վերջնական օգտագործողը պատրաստ է սպասել, մինչև ամբողջ նախադասությունը տպագրվի, որպեսզի միավորները հայտնաբերվեն և ավելի լավ կապված լինեն հայտնաբերողների հետ կամ Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր փորձարկման կառուցվածք ՆԵՌ համակարգերի համար ծրագրերի համար, որտեղ որոշումները կոչված էության սահմանների մասին պետք է կատարվեն առցանց ձևով: Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե ինչպես են այս կառուցվածքի մեթոդները կատարվում բազմաթիվ լեզուներով, և առաջարկում ենք ադապտացիաներ այս մոդելներին, որպեսզի համապատասխանեն այս նոր փորձարկման կառուցվածքին: Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ ամենալավ համակարգերը, որոնք գնահատվում են յուրաքանչյուր նշանի վրա դրա տպելուց հետո, հասնում են արդյունքին 1-5 F1 կետի ընթացքում համակարգերի, որոնք գնահատվում են նախադասության վերջում: Սրանք ցույց են տալիս, որ միավորների ճանաչելը կարող է կատարվել այս կառուցվածքում և բացել այլ ՆԼՊ գործիքների զարգացումը նման կառուցվածքում:', 'cs': 'Identifikace pojmenovaných entit v psaném textu je základní součástí procesu zpracování textu používaného v aplikacích, jako jsou textové editory pro lepší porozumění sémantice textu. Typické experimentální nastavení pro hodnocení systémů NER (Named Entity Recognition) však není přímo použitelné na systémy, které zpracovávají text v reálném čase při psaní textu. Hodnocení se provádí na úrovni věty za předpokladu, že koncový uživatel je ochoten počkat, dokud nebude zadána celá věta, aby byly entity identifikovány a dále propojeny s identifikátory nebo společně odkazovány. Představujeme nové experimentální nastavení NER systémů pro aplikace, kde je třeba rozhodovat o pojmenovaných hranicích entit online. Studujeme, jak fungují moderní metody v tomto nastavení ve více jazycích a navrhujeme adaptace těchto modelů tak, aby vyhovovaly tomuto novému experimentálnímu nastavení. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že nejlepší systémy, které jsou hodnoceny na každém tokenu po jeho napsání, dosahují výkonu v bodech 1-5 F1 systémů, které jsou hodnoceny na konci věty. Ty ukazují, že v tomto nastavení lze provést rozpoznávání entit a otevírají vývoj dalších NLP nástrojů v podobném nastavení.', 'ca': "Identificar entitats anomenades en text escrit és un component essencial del pipeline de processament de text utilitzat en aplicacions com els editors de text per a obtenir una millor comprensió de la semàntica del text. No obstant això, la típica configuració experimental per avaluar els sistemes de reconeixement nominat d'entitats (NER) no es aplica directament als sistemes que processen el text en temps real mentre el text està escrit. L'evaluació es fa a nivell de frases suposant que l'usuari final està disposat a esperar fins que la frase sencera sigui escrita per identificar les entitats i que siguin més vinculates a identificadors o co-referenciats. Introduïm una nova configuració experimental per sistemes NER per aplicacions on les decisions sobre les fronteres d'entitats anomenades han de ser executades en línia. Estudem com els mètodes més avançats actuen sota aquesta configuració en múltiples llengües i proposem adaptacions a aquests models per adaptar-se a aquesta nova configuració experimental. Els resultats experimentals mostren que els millors sistemes que s'evaluen en cada fitxa després de la seva tipulació arriben a un rendiment entre 1 i 5 punts F1 de sistemes que s'evaluen al final de la frase. These show that entity recognition can be performed in this setup and open up the development of other NLP tools in a similar setup.", 'et': 'Nimetatud üksuste tuvastamine kirjalikus tekstis on oluline osa tekstitöötluse torustikust, mida kasutatakse rakendustes nagu tekstiredaktorid, et paremini mõista teksti semantikat. Tüüpiline eksperimentaalne seadistus nimetatud üksuste tuvastamise (NER) süsteemide hindamiseks ei ole otseselt kohaldatav süsteemide suhtes, mis töötlevad teksti reaalajas teksti tippimise ajal. Hindamine toimub lausetasemel eeldusel, et lõppkasutaja on valmis ootama, kuni kogu lause trükitakse, et üksused oleksid tuvastatud ja identifikaatoritega edasi seotud või kaasviidatud. Tutvustame NER-süsteemide uudset eksperimentaalset seadistust rakendustele, kus otsuseid nimetatud olemipiiride kohta tuleb teha internetis. Me uurime, kuidas kaasaegsed meetodid toimivad selle seadistuse all mitmes keeles ja pakume välja nende mudelite kohandusi, et sobida sellele uuele eksperimentaalsele seadistusele. Katsetulemused näitavad, et parimad süsteemid, mida hinnatakse igal märgil pärast selle tippimist, saavutavad jõudluse 1–5 F1 punkti ulatuses süsteemidest, mida hinnatakse lause lõpus. Need näitavad, et olemi tuvastamist saab selles seadistuses teha ja avavad teiste NLP tööriistade arendamise sarnases seadistuses.', 'fi': 'Nimettyjen entiteettien tunnistaminen kirjallisessa tekstissä on olennainen osa tekstinkäsittelyputkea, jota käytetään sovelluksissa, kuten tekstieditoreissa, tekstin semantiikan ymmärtämiseksi paremmin. Tyypillinen kokeellinen asetus Nimettyjen entiteettien tunnistusjärjestelmien (NER) arvioimiseksi ei kuitenkaan sovellu suoraan järjestelmiin, jotka käsittelevät tekstiä reaaliajassa tekstin kirjoittamisen aikana. Arviointi suoritetaan lausetasolla olettaen, että loppukäyttäjä on valmis odottamaan, kunnes koko lause kirjoitetaan, jotta entiteetit tunnistetaan ja liitetään edelleen tunnisteisiin tai rinnakkaisiin viittauksiin. Esittelemme uuden kokeellisen kokoonpanon NER-järjestelmille sovelluksiin, joissa nimettyjä entiteettirajoja koskevat päätökset on tehtävä verkossa. Tutkimme, miten uusimmat menetelmät toimivat tässä asennuksessa useilla kielillä ja ehdotamme näiden mallien mukautuksia tähän uuteen kokeelliseen kokoonpanoon. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että parhaat järjestelmät, jotka arvioidaan kunkin merkin kirjoittamisen jälkeen, saavuttavat suorituskyvyn 1-5 F1 pisteen sisällä järjestelmistä, jotka arvioidaan lauseen lopussa. Nämä osoittavat, että entiteettitunnistus voidaan suorittaa tässä asennuksessa ja avaavat muiden NLP-työkalujen kehittämisen vastaavassa asennuksessa.', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Validity Awak dhéwé nggunaké perusahaan éntuk kanggo sistem "NeR" kanggo nggawe aplikasi kanggo disimperasan barang nggawe sistem sing butek nggawe sistem Entèni. Awak dhéwé isih perusahaan-perusahaan-perusahaan kuwi nggawe gerakan sakjane nggawe barang sampek lan unwita supoyatan nggawe modèl iki banget nggawe sampek nggawe ngubah dhéwé. Laptop" and "Desktop Iki menehi wong liya sing bisa ngomong nik akeh sampek iki lan buka nggawe jadeh NLP iki ning sampek sing menehi.', 'he': 'Identifying named entities in written text is an essential component of the text processing pipeline used in applications such as text editors to gain a better understanding of the semantics of the text.  עם זאת, המערכת הניסיונית הטיפוסית לבדיקת מערכות זיהוי איכויות בשמות (NER) אינה אפשרית ישירות למערכות שמעבדות טקסט בזמן אמיתי כשהטקסט מודפס. הערכה מתבצעת ברמה של משפט בהנחה שהמשתמש הסופי מוכן לחכות עד שכל המשפט ייקלט כדי שיזהו יחידות ויקשרו יותר לזהות או להתייחס ביחד. אנחנו מציגים ערכת ניסויים חדשה למערכות NER לתוכניות שבו החלטות על גבולות ישויות בשם צריכות להתבצע באופן אינטרנט. אנחנו לומדים איך שיטות חדשות מתנהגות תחת ההערכה הזאת בשפות רבות ומציעים שינויים לדוגמנים האלה כדי להתאים להערכת הניסויית החדשה הזאת. תוצאות ניסויים מראות שהמערכות הטובות ביותר שנערכות על כל סימן לאחר הכתיבה, מגיעות להופעה בתוך 1-5 נקודות F1 של מערכות שנערכות בסוף המשפט. אלה מראים שהזיהוי של היחידות יכול להיבצע במערכת זו ולפתוח את הפיתוח של כלי NLP אחרים במערכת דומה.', 'sk': 'Identifikacija imenovanih entitet v pisnem besedilu je bistvena sestavina cevovoda za obdelavo besedila, ki se uporablja v aplikacijah, kot so urejevalniki besedil, da bi bolje razumeli semantiko besedila. Vendar pa tipična poskusna nastavitev za ocenjevanje sistemov za prepoznavanje imenovanih subjektov (NER) ni neposredno uporabna za sisteme, ki obdelujejo besedilo v realnem času med tipkanjem besedila. Ocenjevanje se izvaja na ravni stavka, če je končni uporabnik pripravljen počakati, da se celoten stavek vnese, da se entitete identificirajo in nadalje povežejo z identifikatorji ali so-referencirani. Predstavljamo novo eksperimentalno nastavitev sistemov NER za aplikacije, kjer je treba odločitve o imenovanih mejah entitet izvajati na spletu. Preučujemo, kako najsodobnejše metode delujejo pod to postavitvijo v več jezikih in predlagamo prilagoditve teh modelov, ki ustrezajo tej novi eksperimentalni postavitvi. Poskusni rezultati kažejo, da najboljši sistemi, ki so ocenjeni na vsakem žetonu po njegovem tipkanju, dosežejo zmogljivost znotraj 1-5 točk F1 sistemov, ki so ocenjeni na koncu stavka. Ti kažejo, da je mogoče v tej nastavitvi prepoznati subjekte in odpreti razvoj drugih orodij NLP v podobni nastavitvi.', 'ha': "An gane abun da aka sune cikin matsayin rubutu, yana da kima mai muhimu wa pibeline na aiki na matsayin da aka yi amfani da cikin shiryoyin ayuka kamar matsayin tahrirchi dõmin ya motsa mafiya fahimci ga semantikken na matsayin. A lokacin da, tsarin jarrabãwa na ɗabi'a don a yi amfani da sunan AJinta Entity (NER) na'ura ba masu amfani da shiryoyin system wanda ke aikata matsayin a cikin lokaci da za'a rubutu. An cika Canza a kan wata daraja na cewa mai amfani da shi ƙarshen zartar da za'a yi jira har a yi ƙunci da duk cewa an gane da abun da za'a yi amfani da shi ko kuwa ana sami-cire shi. Kana ƙuyya da tsarin taƙaita ta sabo da tsari na tsari na NER wa shiryoyin ayukan ayukan ayuka, inda za'a yi amfani da tsarin abun da aka suna tsarin abun. We study how state-of-the-art methods perform under this setup in multiple languages and propose adaptations to these models to suit this new experimental setup.  Mataimakin jarrabawa ya nuna cewa masu kyaun system waɗanda ke qiymar a kan kõwa ãyoyin a lokacin da aka typa shi, su kai ga performance guda na pointi 1-5 F1 na'ura da za'a qiymar ta ƙarshen hukuma. Wannan suna nuna cewa za'a iya samar da shaidar abun cikin wannan tsari kuma a buɗe kwamfyutan kayan aiki na NLP cikin shirin daidaita kamar wannan.", 'bo': 'Identifying named entities in written text is an essential component of the text processing pipeline used in applications such as text editors to gain a better understanding of the semantics of the text. ཡིན་ནའང་། the typical experimental setup for evaluating Named Entity Recognition (NER) systems is not directly applicable to systems that process text in real time as the text is being typed. Evaluation is performed in a sentence level assuming the end-user is willing to wait until the entire sentence is typed to entities to be identified and further linked to identifiers or co-referenced. ང་ཚོས་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་མིང་དང་དབང་ཆ་མཐའ་དབུགས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ལ་བརྡ་གཏོང་བ་ཞིག་གསར་གཏོང་གི་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས We study how state-of-the-art methods perform under this setup in multiple languages and propose adaptations to these models to suit this new experimental setup. ལག་ལས་འཚོལ་བ་དག་གི་འགྱུར་བ་དག་གི་རྟགས་རེ་རེ་བ་ལྟར་བཀོད་ཡོད་པའི་མ་ལག་རེ་རེ་ཤོས་ཀྱང་ཚད་ལྡན་བྱས་པ་ལྟར་ཡར་རྒྱས་ལྗོངས་ཀྱི་ སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་དབང་ཆ་དེ་ཚོ་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་ལག་ཆ་གཞན་ཡང་མ་མཐུན་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ'}
{'en': 'SANDI : Story-and-Images Alignment', 'ar': 'ساندي: محاذاة القصة والصور', 'fr': "SANDI\xa0: Alignement de l'histoire et des images", 'pt': 'SANDI: Alinhamento de Histórias e Imagens', 'es': 'SANDI: Alineación de historia e imágenes', 'ja': 'SANDI: STORY - and - Image Alignment', 'zh': '桑迪:对齐', 'hi': 'SANDI: कहानी और छवियाँ संरेखण', 'ru': 'SANDI: Выравнивание Историй и Изображений', 'ga': 'SANDI: Ailíniú Scéalta agus Íomhánna', 'ka': 'SANDI: ისტორია და გამოსახულების შენახვა', 'hu': 'SANDI: Történet és képek összehangolása', 'it': 'SANDI: Allineamento di storie e immagini', 'kk': 'SANDI: Журнал мен кескіндерді түзету', 'lt': 'SANDI: Story-and-Images Alignment', 'mk': 'Соредување на приказни и слики', 'el': 'SANDI: Στοίχιση ιστοριών και εικόνων', 'ms': 'SANDI: Jajaran Cerita-dan-Imej', 'ml': 'സാന്\u200dഡിഐ: കഥകളും ചിത്രങ്ങളും ചേര്\u200dത്തിരിക്കുക', 'mn': 'SANDI: Түүх болон зургуудын талбар', 'mt': 'SANDI: Allinjament tal-Story-and-Images', 'no': 'SANDI: Justering av storleik og bilete', 'ro': 'SANDI: Alinierea povești și imagini', 'pl': 'SANDI: Wyrównanie opowieści i obrazów', 'sr': 'Pozor priče i slike', 'si': 'SANDI: කතාවය සහ පින්තූරය සම්පූර්ණය', 'sv': 'SANDI: Justering av berättelse och bilder', 'so': 'SANDI: Soo similarity', 'ta': 'சான்டி', 'ur': 'SANDI: کہانی اور تصاویر الیمینٹ', 'uz': 'SNDI: Tarix va rasmlarni tekislash', 'vi': 'Nẩm cảnh tượng', 'bg': 'Подравняване на истории и изображения', 'da': 'SANDI: Historie- og- billedjustering', 'hr': 'SANDI: Upravljanje priče i slike', 'id': 'SANDI: Penjajaran Cerita-dan-Gambar', 'de': 'SANDI: Ausrichtung von Story und Bildern', 'nl': 'SANDI: Verhaal- en beelduitlijning', 'tr': 'SANDI: Geçmiş ve-Resimler Çetleşmesi', 'ko': 'SANDI: 이미지에 스토리 정렬', 'fa': 'SANDI: تنظیم داستان و تصاویر', 'sw': 'SANDI: Utawala wa simulizi na picha', 'hy': 'Սանդի` Պատմություն և պատկերներ', 'af': 'SANDI: Story- and- Images Alignment', 'am': 'undo-type', 'az': 'SANDI: Hikay톛-v톛-R톛sml톛r Q캼d캼rmas캼', 'bn': 'সান্ডিডি: গল্প- এবং ছবির সমন্বয়', 'cs': 'SANDI: Zarovnání příběhů a obrázků', 'bs': 'Spremljenje priče i slike', 'et': 'SANDI: Lugude ja piltide joondamine', 'ca': 'SANDI: Story-and-Images Alignment', 'fi': 'SANDI: Tarinan ja kuvien tasaus', 'sq': 'SANDI: Story-and-Images Alignment', 'ha': 'SANDI: Tsariya na Kwamfyuta da zane', 'he': 'התאמה של סיפורים ותמונות', 'sk': 'SANDI: uskladitev zgodb in slik', 'jv': 'SamNDI: Daftar-lan-Gambar Align', 'bo': 'SANDI: Story-and-Images Alignment'}
{'en': 'The Internet contains a multitude of social media posts and other of stories where text is interspersed with images. In these contexts, images are not simply used for general illustration, but are judiciously placed in certain spots of a story for multimodal descriptions and narration. In this work we analyze the problem of text-image alignment, and present SANDI, a methodology for automatically selecting images from an image collection and aligning them with text paragraphs of a story. SANDI combines visual tags, user-provided tags and background knowledge, and uses an Integer Linear Program to compute alignments that are semantically meaningful. Experiments show that SANDI can select and align images with texts with high quality of semantic fit.', 'ar': 'يحتوي الإنترنت على العديد من منشورات وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي وغيرها من القصص التي يتخللها النص بالصور. في هذه السياقات ، لا تُستخدم الصور للتوضيح العام فحسب ، بل يتم وضعها بحكمة في أماكن معينة من القصة للأوصاف والسرد متعدد الوسائط. في هذا العمل ، نحلل مشكلة محاذاة النص مع الصورة ، ونقدم SANDI ، وهي منهجية لاختيار الصور تلقائيًا من مجموعة الصور ومواءمتها مع فقرات نصية من القصة. تجمع SANDI بين العلامات المرئية والعلامات التي يوفرها المستخدم والمعرفة الخلفية ، وتستخدم برنامجًا خطيًا صحيحًا لحساب المحاذاة ذات المعنى الدلالي. تظهر التجارب أن SANDI يمكنها تحديد ومواءمة الصور مع النصوص بجودة عالية من التوافق الدلالي.', 'pt': 'A Internet contém uma infinidade de postagens de mídia social e outras de histórias em que o texto é intercalado com imagens. Nesses contextos, as imagens não são usadas apenas para ilustração geral, mas são colocadas criteriosamente em determinados pontos de uma história para descrições e narrações multimodais. Neste trabalho analisamos o problema de alinhamento texto-imagem e apresentamos o SANDI, uma metodologia para selecionar automaticamente imagens de uma coleção de imagens e alinhá-las com parágrafos de texto de uma história. A SANDI combina tags visuais, tags fornecidas pelo usuário e conhecimento prévio, e usa um programa linear inteiro para calcular alinhamentos que são semanticamente significativos. Experimentos mostram que SANDI pode selecionar e alinhar imagens com textos com alta qualidade de ajuste semântico.', 'fr': "Internet contient une multitude de publications sur les réseaux sociaux et d'autres histoires où le texte est entrecoupé d'images. Dans ces contextes, les images ne sont pas simplement utilisées à des fins d'illustration générale, mais sont judicieusement placées à certains endroits d'une histoire pour des descriptions et une narration multimodales. Dans ce travail, nous analysons le problème de l'alignement texte-image et présentons SANDI, une méthodologie qui permet de sélectionner automatiquement des images d'une collection d'images et de les aligner avec les paragraphes de texte d'une histoire. SANDI combine des balises visuelles, des balises fournies par l'utilisateur et des connaissances de base, et utilise un programme linéaire entier pour calculer des alignements sémantiquement significatifs. Les expériences montrent que SANDI peut sélectionner et aligner des images avec des textes avec un ajustement sémantique de haute qualité.", 'es': 'Internet contiene una multitud de publicaciones en redes sociales y otras historias en las que el texto se entremezcla con imágenes. En estos contextos, las imágenes no se utilizan simplemente como ilustración general, sino que se colocan juiciosamente en ciertos puntos de una historia para descripciones y narraciones multimodales. En este trabajo analizamos el problema de la alineación texto-imagen, y presentamos SANDI, una metodología para seleccionar automáticamente imágenes de una colección de imágenes y alinearlas con párrafos de texto de una historia. SANDI combina etiquetas visuales, etiquetas proporcionadas por el usuario y conocimientos previos, y utiliza un Programa Lineal Integer para calcular alineaciones que son semánticamente significativas. Los experimentos muestran que SANDI puede seleccionar y alinear imágenes con textos con un ajuste semántico de alta calidad.', 'ja': 'インターネットには、ソーシャルメディアの投稿や、テキストが画像に挟まれている他の種類のストーリーが多数含まれている。これらの文脈では、画像は単に一般的な例示のために使用されるのではなく、マルチモーダルな説明とナレーションのために物語の特定の場所に慎重に配置されます。この作品では、テキストと画像の配置の問題を分析し、画像コレクションから画像を自動的に選択し、ストーリーのテキストの段落に合わせる方法論であるSandiを提示します。SANDIは、ビジュアルタグ、ユーザーが提供するタグ、および背景知識を組み合わせ、整数リニアプログラムを使用して、意味的に有意義なアライメントを計算します。実験によると、SANDIは高品質のセマンティックフィットで画像を選択し、テキストに合わせることができます。', 'zh': '互联网多含社交媒体帖及他故事,其中文本中穿插着图像。 凡此诸上下文,图像非止常言,且置明于故事者,以模态述焉。 于是论其文本 - 像对齐而SANDI之,此自合于图像而段落之于故事也。 SANDI 合视听、用户识、背景知,以全数线性计语义有义者齐之。 实验明,SANDI可择图而齐其高质量语义拟合也。', 'hi': 'इंटरनेट में सोशल मीडिया पोस्ट और अन्य कहानियों की एक भीड़ शामिल है जहां पाठ छवियों के साथ जुड़ा हुआ है। इन संदर्भों में, छवियों का उपयोग केवल सामान्य चित्रण के लिए नहीं किया जाता है, बल्कि बहुआयामी विवरण और कथन के लिए एक कहानी के कुछ स्थानों में विवेकपूर्ण रूप से रखा जाता है। इस काम में हम पाठ-छवि संरेखण की समस्या का विश्लेषण करते हैं, और SANDI, एक छवि संग्रह से छवियों को स्वचालित रूप से चुनने और उन्हें एक कहानी के पाठ पैराग्राफ के साथ संरेखित करने के लिए एक पद्धति प्रस्तुत करते हैं। SANDI दृश्य टैग, उपयोगकर्ता द्वारा प्रदान किए गए टैग और पृष्ठभूमि ज्ञान को जोड़ती है, और शब्दार्थ रूप से सार्थक संरेखण की गणना करने के लिए एक पूर्णांक रैखिक कार्यक्रम का उपयोग करती है। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि SANDI का चयन करें और शब्दार्थ फिट की उच्च गुणवत्ता के साथ ग्रंथों के साथ छवियों को संरेखित कर सकते हैं.', 'ru': 'Интернет содержит множество постов в социальных сетях и других историй, где текст перемешивается с изображениями. В этих контекстах изображения не просто используются для общей иллюстрации, а разумно размещаются в определенных местах истории для мультимодальных описаний и повествования. В данной работе мы анализируем проблему выравнивания текста и изображения и представляем SANDI, методологию автоматического отбора изображений из коллекции изображений и выравнивания их с текстовыми абзацами истории. SANDI объединяет визуальные теги, пользовательские теги и фоновые знания и использует целочисленную линейную программу для вычисления выравниваний, которые являются семантически значимыми. Эксперименты показывают, что СЭНДИ может выбирать и выравнивать изображения с текстами с высоким качеством семантической подгонки.', 'ga': 'Tá an iliomad postálacha meán sóisialta agus eile de scéalta ar an Idirlíon ina bhfuil an téacs idirscartha le híomhánna. Sna comhthéacsanna seo, ní hamháin go n-úsáidtear íomhánna mar léiriú ginearálta, ach cuirtear go tuisceanach iad i spotaí áirithe den scéal le haghaidh cur síos agus insint ilmhódach. San obair seo déanaimid anailís ar fhadhb ailíniú téacs-íomhá, agus cuirimid SANDI i láthair, modheolaíocht chun íomhánna a roghnú go huathoibríoch ó bhailiúchán íomhánna agus iad a ailíniú le míreanna téacs de scéal. Nascann SANDI clibeanna amhairc, clibeanna arna soláthar ag úsáideoirí agus eolas cúlra, agus úsáideann sé Clár Líneach Slánuimhir chun ailínithe a bhfuil brí shéimeantach leo a ríomh. Léiríonn turgnaimh gur féidir le SANDI íomhánna a roghnú agus a ailíniú le téacsanna a bhfuil ardcháilíocht oiriúnach shéimeantach orthu.', 'hu': 'Az internet számos közösségi média bejegyzést és egyéb történetet tartalmaz, ahol a szöveg képekkel szóródik. Ezekben az összefüggésekben a képeket nem csupán általános illusztrációra használják, hanem bölcsen helyezik el a történet bizonyos pontjait multimodális leírások és narráció céljából. Ebben a munkában elemezzük a szöveg-kép igazítás problémáját, és bemutatjuk a SANDI módszert, amely a képek automatikus kiválasztására és a történet szövegbekezdéseihez igazítására szolgál. A SANDI egyesíti a vizuális címkéket, a felhasználó által biztosított címkéket és a háttér ismereteket, és egy egész lineáris programot használ a szemantikailag jelentős igazítások kiszámítására. A kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a SANDI kiváló minőségű szemantikai illeszkedéssel képes kiválasztani és igazítani a képeket a szövegekhez.', 'el': 'Το Διαδίκτυο περιέχει ένα πλήθος δημοσιεύσεων στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης και άλλες ιστορίες όπου το κείμενο διασταυρώνεται με εικόνες. Σε αυτά τα πλαίσια, οι εικόνες δεν χρησιμοποιούνται απλά για γενική απεικόνιση, αλλά τοποθετούνται λογικά σε ορισμένα σημεία μιας ιστορίας για πολυπροπικές περιγραφές και αφήγηση. Στην παρούσα εργασία αναλύουμε το πρόβλημα της ευθυγράμμισης κειμένου-εικόνας και παρουσιάζουμε μια μεθοδολογία αυτόματης επιλογής εικόνων από μια συλλογή εικόνων και ευθυγράμμισής τους με παραγράφους κειμένου μιας ιστορίας. Συνδυάζει οπτικές ετικέτες, ετικέτες που παρέχονται από το χρήστη και γνώσεις φόντου και χρησιμοποιεί ένα ακέραιο γραμμικό πρόγραμμα για τον υπολογισμό ευθυγραμμίσεων που έχουν σημασιολογική σημασία. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι μπορεί να επιλέξει και να ευθυγραμμίσει εικόνες με κείμενα υψηλής ποιότητας σημασιολογικής προσαρμογής.', 'it': "Internet contiene una moltitudine di post sui social media e altre storie in cui il testo è intervallato da immagini. In questi contesti, le immagini non sono utilizzate semplicemente per l'illustrazione generale, ma sono sapientemente collocate in alcuni punti di una storia per descrizioni e narrazioni multimodali. In questo lavoro analizziamo il problema dell'allineamento testo-immagine, e presentiamo SANDI, una metodologia per selezionare automaticamente le immagini da una raccolta di immagini e allinearle ai paragrafi di testo di una storia. SANDI combina tag visivi, tag forniti dall'utente e conoscenze di background e utilizza un programma lineare intero per calcolare allineamenti semanticamente significativi. Gli esperimenti dimostrano che SANDI può selezionare e allineare immagini con testi di alta qualità di adattamento semantico.", 'ka': 'ინტერნეტი აქვს ზოგიერთი სოციალური მედია პოსტი და სხვა ისტორიები, სადაც ტექსტი სურათებით ინტერსპერიზებულია. ამ კონტექსტებში, სურათები არა მხოლოდ საერთო თლუსტრაციისთვის გამოყენებული, მაგრამ სურათების განსაკუთრებულ წერტილებში მულტიმოდიალური განახლებისთვის და განახლებისთვის და ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ ტექსტის გამოსახულების განტოლების პრობლემას ანალიზებას და SANDI-ს გამოსახულებას, სურათის კოლექციის გამოსახულების ავტომატურად არჩევა და ისინი ტექსტის პარაგრაფი Name ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენება, რომ SANDI შეუძლია გამოყენება და გამოყენება ტექსტებით, რომელიც სიმენტიკური შესაძლებლობა.', 'lt': 'Internete yra daug socialinių žiniasklaidos postų ir kitų istorijų, kuriose tekstas susiejamas su vaizdais. Šiomis aplinkybėmis vaizdai naudojami ne tik bendroms iliustracijoms, bet ir protingai įtraukiami į tam tikras įvairiarūšio aprašymo ir narracijos istorijos vietas. Šiame darbe analizuojame teksto ir vaizdo suderinimo problem ą ir pristatome SANDI, metodiką, skirtą automatiškai atrinkti vaizdus iš vaizdo rinkinio ir suderinti juos su istorijos teksto punktais. SANDI derina vizualius ženklus, naudotojo suteiktus ženklus ir fonines žinias ir naudoja Visą linijinę programą skaičiuojant semantiškai reikšmingus suderinimus. Experiments show that SANDI can select and align images with texts with high quality of semantic fit.', 'mk': 'Интернетот содржи многу постови за социјални медиуми и други приказни каде текстот се интерсперира со слики. Во овие контексти, сликите не се користат само за генерална илустрација, туку се разумно ставени во одредени места на приказната за мултимодилни описи и раскажувања. Во оваа работа го анализираме проблемот со уредувањето на текст-слика, и го претставуваме SANDI, методологија за автоматски избор на слики од колекција на слики и нивното уредување со текст параграфи од приказна. SANDI комбинира визуелни ознаки, ознаки обезбедени од корисникот и знаење од позадина, и користи целосна линијарна програма за пресметка на поставувања кои се семантично значајни. Experiments show that SANDI can select and align images with texts with high quality of semantic fit.', 'kk': 'Интернет көптеген социалдық медиа поштасы және кескіндермен мәтінді орындайтын оқиғалар бар. Бұл жағдайда кескіндер тек жалпы иллюстрация үшін қолданылмайды, бірақ көптеген түсініктер мен түсініктер үшін бірнеше түсініктерінде орнатылады. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз мәтін- кескіндердің түзету мәселесін анализ және SANDI дегенді, кескіндердің жинақтағы суреттерді автоматты түрде таңдау және оқиғаның мәтін параграфияларына түзету мә SANDI көрінетін тегтерді, пайдаланушыларға келтірілген тегтерді және аясының білімін біріктіреді, және semantically meaningful тегтерді есептеу үшін толық сызық бағдарламасын қолданады. Тәжірибелер SANDI кескіндерді семантикалық сәйкестіктердің жоғары сапатты мәтіндермен таңдап, түзетуге болады дегенді көрсетеді.', 'ml': 'ഇന്റര്\u200dനെറ്റില്\u200d ഒരുപാട് സാമൂഹ്യ മാധ്യമങ്ങളുടെ പോസ്റ്റുകളും മറ്റു കഥകളും ഉണ്ട്. വാചകം ചിത്രങ്ങളുമായ ഈ ചിഹ്നങ്ങളില്\u200d, ചിത്രങ്ങള്\u200d പൊതുവായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് മാത്രമേ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നുള്ളൂ എന്നാല്\u200d മറ്റൊരു വിവരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും  ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ചിത്രത്തിന്റെ ചിത്രത്തിന്റെ പ്രശ്നം അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു, സാന്\u200dഡിഐ, ഒരു ചിത്രത്തിന്റെ സംഘത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ച SANDI കാഴ്ചയുടെ ടാഗുകള്\u200d, ഉപയോക്താവിന് നല്\u200dകിയ ടാഗുകളും പശ്ചാത്തലത്തിന്\u200dറെ അറിവുകളും കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. പിന്നീട് ആവശ്യമുള്ള ഒരു  Experiments show that SANDI can select and align images with texts with high quality of semantic fit.', 'ms': 'Internet mengandungi banyak pos media sosial dan cerita lain di mana teks disertai dengan imej. Dalam konteks ini, imej tidak hanya digunakan untuk ilustrasi umum, tetapi ditempatkan dengan bijak di tempat tertentu cerita untuk deskripsi multimodal dan cerita. In this work we analyze the problem of text-image alignment, and present SANDI, a methodology for automatically selecting images from an image collection and aligning them with text paragraphs of a story.  SANDI menggabungkan tag visual, tag diberikan oleh pengguna dan pengetahuan latar belakang, dan menggunakan Program Linear Integer untuk menghitung penyesuaian yang bermakna secara semantik. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa SANDI boleh pilih dan jajar imej dengan teks dengan kualiti tinggi muatan semantik.', 'no': 'Internett inneheld mange sosiale meldingar og andre historiar der teksten vert spelt med bilete. I desse kontekstane blir bilete ikkje enkelt brukte for generelle illustrasjon, men blir rettleg plassert i nokre punkt av ei historie for fleire modal skildringar og hendingar. I dette arbeidet analyserer vi problemet med utforming av tekstbilete, og presenterer SANDI ein metode for å automatisk velja bilete frå eit biletssamling og justera dei med tekstavsnitt av ei historie. SANDI kombinerer visuelle taggar, brukaragentleg taggar og bakgrunnsverktøy, og brukar ein heiltal linjerprogram for å rekna ut innstillingar som er semantisk betydelig. Eksperimentar viser at SANDI kan velja og justera bilete med tekstar med høg kvalitet for semantisk tilpassing.', 'mn': 'Интернет маш олон нийгмийн мэдээллийн хуудас, мөн өөр түүх нь зурагтай холбогдож байгаа. Эдгээр нөхцөлд, зураг зөвхөн ерөнхий дүрслэлд хэрэглэгддэггүй, гэхдээ олон загварын түүхийн зарим хэсэгт ойлголт болон түүхийн тулд зөвхөн хэрэглэгддэг. Энэ ажлын тулд бид текст зураг тэгшитгэлийн асуудлыг шинжилгээ хийж, SANDI-г автоматаар зураг цуглуулж, түүхийн текст хэсгүүдтэй тэгшитгэлийн аргаар сонгох арга зам болгодог. SANDI-г хэрэглэгчид өгсөн тегт болон түүний мэдлэг цуглуулдаг. Тэгээд бүтэн шугамны програмыг үргэлж утгатай тэгшитгэлийг тооцохын тулд ашигладаг. САНДИ-ын туршилтууд хэмжээний төвөгтэй өндөр чанартай зурагт сонгож болох боломжтой болохыг харуулдаг.', 'ro': 'Internetul conține o multitudine de postări de social media și alte povești în care textul este intercalat cu imagini. În aceste contexte, imaginile nu sunt folosite doar pentru ilustrare generală, ci sunt plasate judecător în anumite locuri ale unei povești pentru descrieri multimodale și narațiuni. În această lucrare analizăm problema alinierii text-imagine și prezentăm SANDI, o metodologie pentru selectarea automată a imaginilor dintr-o colecție de imagini și alinierea acestora cu paragrafele text ale unei povești. SANDI combină etichete vizuale, etichete furnizate de utilizator și cunoștințe de fundal și utilizează un program liniar întreg pentru a calcula alinierile care sunt semnificative semantic. Experimentele arată că SANDI poate selecta și alinia imaginile cu texte cu o calitate ridicată de potrivire semantică.', 'pl': 'W Internecie znajduje się mnóstwo postów w mediach społecznościowych i innych opowieści, w których tekst jest przeplatany obrazami. W tych kontekstach obrazy nie są wykorzystywane tylko do ogólnej ilustracji, ale są rozsądnie umieszczane w pewnych miejscach opowieści dla multimodalnych opisów i narracji. W niniejszej pracy analizujemy problem wyrównania tekstu-obrazu oraz przedstawiamy SANDI, metodologię automatycznego wyboru obrazów z kolekcji obrazów i dopasowania ich do akapitów tekstowych opowieści. SANDI łączy znaczniki wizualne, znaczniki dostarczane przez użytkownika i wiedzę tła i wykorzystuje program liniowy całkowitej do obliczania wyrównań, które mają znaczenie semantyczne. Eksperymenty pokazują, że SANDI może wybierać i wyrównywać obrazy z tekstami o wysokiej jakości dopasowania semantycznego.', 'sr': 'Internet a sadrži mnoge postove društvenih medija i druge priče u kojima se tekst intersperira sa slikama. U tim kontekstima, slike se ne koriste jednostavno za generalnu ilustraciju, već su sudski stavljene na određene tačke priče za multimodalne opise i priče. U ovom poslu analiziramo problem poravnanja tekstova slika i predstavljamo SANDI, metodologiju za automatski izabranje slika iz kolekcije slika i poravnanje ih tekstskim paragrafama priče. SANDI kombinira vizuelne znakove, znakove pružene korisnikom i pozadinske znanje, i koristi Integer Linear Program da računate poravnanje koje su semantički značajne. Eksperimenti pokazuju da SANDI može izabrati i prilagoditi slike tekstima sa visokom kvalitetom semantičkog pristupa.', 'si': 'අන්තර්ජාලයේ සාමාජික මිඩියාව පොස්ටල් වලින් අනිත් කතාවල් වලින් තියෙනවා වගේ පින්තූර වලින මේ සංවේදනයේ පින්තූරු සාමාන්\u200dය පින්තූරණය සඳහා භාවිත කරන්නේ නැහැ, ඒත් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂ කතාවක් සහ කතාවක් වලින මේ වැඩේ අපි පිළිබඳ පිළිබඳ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා, සහ SANDI පිළිබඳ පිළිබඳ පිළිබඳ සංගීතයෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන්  Name පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ SANDI පින්තූරය තෝරාගන්න සහ පින්තූරය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ විශේෂ', 'sv': 'Internet innehåller en mängd sociala medier inlägg och andra berättelser där text varvas med bilder. I dessa sammanhang används bilder inte bara för allmän illustration, utan placeras klokt på vissa ställen i en berättelse för multimodala beskrivningar och berättande. I detta arbete analyserar vi problemet med text-bild justering, och presenterar SANDI, en metod för att automatiskt välja bilder från en bildsamling och anpassa dem till textstycken i en berättelse. SANDI kombinerar visuella taggar, användartillhandahållna taggar och bakgrundskunskap, och använder ett heltalslinjärt program för att beräkna justeringar som är semantiskt betydelsefulla. Experiment visar att SANDI kan välja och anpassa bilder till texter med hög kvalitet på semantisk passform.', 'ta': 'இணையத்தில் பெரும்பாலான சமூக ஊடக அஞ்சல்கள் மற்றும் மற்ற கதைகள் உள்ளன உரை படங்களுடன் இணைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது. இந்த முறையில், பிம்பங்கள் பொதுவான விளக்கத்திற்கு மட்டுமே பயன்படுத்தப்படவில்லை, ஆனால் பல விளக்கங்கள் மற்றும் விவரங்களுக்கு சில ச இந்த வேலையில் நாம் உரைப் பிம்பத்தை ஒழுங்குபடுத்தும் பிரச்சனையை ஆராய்ந்து, தற்போது SANDI, ஒரு பிம்பத்தை தானாகவே தேர்ந்தெடு SANDI பார்வையுடைய ஒட்டுகள், பயனர் வழங்கப்பட்ட ஒட்டுகள் மற்றும் பின்னணி அறிவை ஒன்று சேர்க்கும், மற்றும் ஒரு முழு கோடு நிரலை பயன்படுத சான்டிடி உருவங்களை உரைகளுடன் உயர்ந்த தேர்ந்தெடுத்து வரிசைப்படுத்த முடியும் என்பதைக் காட்டுகிறது.', 'so': 'Internetka waxaa ku jira warqado badan oo ku qoran shabakado bulshada iyo warqado kale oo ay ku qoran karto sawirro. Waxyaabahaas sawirro looma isticmaalo tusaale ahaan oo kaliya, laakiin waxaa lagu sharciga ku qoraa warqado kala duduwan iyo warqad kala duduwan. Shaqadan waxaynu ku analyeynaa dhibaatada isbedelka sawir-sawir, hadana SANDI, qaab ay si automatic ah u dooran karto sawir laga soo ururiyo islamarkaasna a an ku sawiraynaa qoraal sawir ah. SANDI wuxuu isku biiriyaa alaabta aragtida, alaabta isticmaalayaasha iyo aqoonta bakhtiga, wuxuuna isticmaalaa barnaamijka caadiga ah oo la xisaabiyaa isbedelyada si ay u faa’iidaysan. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in SANDI ay sawirro ku dooran karto oo ku sawiri karto qoraal aad u eg tijaabada semantic.', 'ur': 'انٹرنیٹ میں بہت سی سوسیل میڈیا پوسٹ اور دوسری کہانیاں ہیں جن میں متن تصاویروں سے بحث کی جاتی ہے. ان موقعیتوں میں تصاویر صرف عمومی تصاویر کے لئے استعمال نہیں کئے جاتے، بلکہ ان کی تعداد کے مطابق ایک کہانی کے چند موقعیتوں میں مقرر کئے جاتے ہیں ہم اس کام میں تفصیل-تصویر تفریق کے مسئلہ کو تحقیق کرتے ہیں، اور SANDI کو پیش کرتے ہیں، ایک طریقہ تصویر کو ایک تصویر کالکٹ سے اپنا انتخاب کرنا اور ان کو ایک کہانی کے متن پراگراف سے تفریق کرنا. SANDI visual tags, user-provided tags and background knowledge combines, and uses an Integer Linear Program to compute alignments that are semantically meaningful. تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ SANDI ٹیکسٹ کے ساتھ اچھی کیفیت کے ساتھ تصاویروں کو انتخاب کر سکتا ہے اور برابری کر سکتا ہے.', 'mt': 'L-Internet fih ħafna postijiet tal-midja soċjali u storji oħra fejn it-test huwa interspersat ma’ immaġni. F’dawn il-kuntesti, l-immaġni mhumiex sempliċement użati għal illustrazzjoni ġenerali, iżda jitqiegħdu b’mod ġust f’ċerti punti ta’ storja għal deskrizzjonijiet u narrazzjoni multimodali. F’din il-ħidma, a ħna nianalizzaw il-problem a tal-allinjament bejn it-test u l-immaġni, u nippreżentaw SANDI, metodoloġija għall-għażla awtomatika tal-immaġni minn ġbir ta’ immaġni u l-allinjament tagħhom mal-paragrafi tat-test ta’ storja. SANDI combines visual tags, user-provided tags and background knowledge, and uses an Integer Linear Program to compute alignments that are semantically meaningful.  Experiments show that SANDI can select and align images with texts with high quality of semantic fit.', 'uz': "Internetda, ma'lumot rasmlar bilan bir necha jamiyat media postlari va boshqa tarixilar bor. Bu paytlarda rasmlar oddiy misollar uchun foydalaniladigan emas, balki ko'pchilik tahrirlari va tahrirlash uchun bir necha joyda juda juda qo'llangan. Ushbu vazifani biz matn- rasmlarni tekislash muammolarini analyzeriz, hozir SANDI, rasm toʻplamdan rasmlarni avtomatik tanlash usuli va ularni qismining matn paragraphlari bilan tekislash. Name Name", 'vi': 'Internet chứa rất nhiều bài viết truyền thông xã hội và các câu chuyện khác nơi văn bản được trộn lẫn với ảnh. Trong những tình huống này, hình ảnh không chỉ được dùng để minh họa chung, mà được đặt một cách khôn ngoan vào những địa điểm của câu chuyện để mô tả và thuật ngữ đa phương. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi phân tích vấn đề cấu hình ảnh văn bản, và trình bày SANước, một phương pháp để tự động chọn ảnh từ một bộ sưu tập ảnh và chỉnh chúng theo các đoạn văn bản của một câu chuyện. Sanim kết hợp các thẻ thị giác, các thẻ cung cấp người dùng và kiến thức nền, và dùng chương trình Interger Linear để tính to án sự hỗ trợ theo ngữ pháp. Các thí nghiệm cho thấy SANDI có thể chọn và kết hợp ảnh với các văn bản với chất lượng ngữ pháp cao.', 'bg': 'Интернет съдържа множество публикации в социалните медии и други истории, където текстът е преплетен с изображения. В тези контексти изображенията не се използват просто за обща илюстрация, но са разумно поставени в определени точки на историята за мултимодални описания и разказ. В тази работа анализираме проблема с подравняването текст-изображение и представяме методология за автоматично избиране на изображения от колекция от изображения и тяхното подравняване с текстови абзаци от история. Комбинира визуални маркери, предоставени от потребителя маркери и фонови познания и използва цяла линейна програма за изчисляване на подравнения, които са семантично значими. Експериментите показват, че може да избира и подравни изображения с текстове с високо качество на семантично прилягане.', 'da': 'Internettet indeholder et væld af indlæg på sociale medier og andre historier, hvor tekst er blandet med billeder. I disse sammenhænge bruges billeder ikke blot til generel illustration, men placeres fornuftigt på visse steder af en historie til multimodale beskrivelser og fortælling. I dette arbejde analyserer vi problemet med tekst-billede justering, og præsenterer SANDI, en metode til automatisk at vælge billeder fra en billedsamling og tilpasse dem til tekst afsnit i en historie. SANDI kombinerer visuelle tags, brugerleverede tags og baggrundsviden, og bruger et Integer Linear Program til at beregne justeringer, der er semantisk meningsfulde. Eksperimenter viser, at SANDI kan vælge og justere billeder med tekster med høj kvalitet af semantisk pasform.', 'id': 'The Internet contains a multitude of social media posts and other of stories where text is interspersed with images.  Dalam konteks ini, gambar tidak hanya digunakan untuk ilustrasi umum, tetapi dengan bijaksana ditempatkan di titik tertentu cerita untuk deskripsi multimodal dan cerita. Dalam pekerjaan ini kami menganalisis masalah penyesuaian gambar-teks, dan mempersembahkan SANDI, metodologi untuk memilih gambar secara otomatis dari koleksi gambar dan menyesuaikan mereka dengan paragraf teks dari sebuah cerita. SANDI menggabungkan tag visual, tag yang diberikan oleh pengguna dan pengetahuan latar belakang, dan menggunakan Program Integer Linear untuk menghitung penyesuaian yang bermakna secara semantis. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa SANDI dapat memilih dan menyesuaikan gambar dengan teks dengan kualitas tinggi sesuai semantis.', 'de': 'Das Internet enthält eine Vielzahl von Social Media Posts und andere Geschichten, in denen Text mit Bildern durchsetzt wird. In diesen Kontexten werden Bilder nicht nur zur allgemeinen Illustration verwendet, sondern gezielt an bestimmten Stellen einer Geschichte für multimodale Beschreibungen und Erzählungen platziert. In dieser Arbeit analysieren wir das Problem der Text-Bild-Ausrichtung und stellen SANDI vor, eine Methode zur automatischen Auswahl von Bildern aus einer Bildsammlung und deren Ausrichtung mit Textabsätzen einer Geschichte. SANDI kombiniert visuelle Tags, benutzerdefinierte Tags und Hintergrundwissen und verwendet ein Integer Linear Programm, um semantisch aussagekräftige Ausrichtungen zu berechnen. Experimente zeigen, dass SANDI Bilder mit Texten mit hoher semantischer Passqualität auswählen und ausrichten kann.', 'ko': '인터넷에는 대량의 소셜 미디어 게시물과 다른 이야기가 포함되어 있는데 그 중에서 텍스트에 그림이 삽입되어 있다.이러한 언어 환경에서 이미지는 일반적인 삽화에만 사용되는 것이 아니라 이야기의 특정한 위치에 현명하게 놓여 다중모드적 묘사와 서술에 사용된다.이 작업에서 우리는 텍스트 이미지의 정렬 문제를 분석하고 SANDI를 소개했다. 이미지 집합에서 자동으로 이미지를 선택하고 이야기의 텍스트 단락과 정렬하는 방법을 소개했다.SANDI는 시각적 표지, 사용자가 제공한 표지와 배경 지식을 결합시키고 정수선형 프로그램을 사용하여 의미의 의미 있는 정렬을 계산한다.실험에 따르면 SANDI는 고품질의 의미가 일치하는 이미지와 텍스트를 선택하고 정렬할 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Intaneti ina makala mengi ya mitandao ya kijamii na hadithi nyingine ambapo maandishi yanazuiwa na picha. Katika matatizo haya, picha hazitumiki kwa ajili ya kuonyesha kwa ujumla, bali zinawekwa kwenye maeneo fulani ya simulizi kwa ajili ya maelezo mengi na hadithi. Katika kazi hii tunachambua tatizo la usambazaji wa picha za maandishi, na sasa SANDI, mbinu ya kuteua picha kwa ajili ya kujichagua picha kutoka kwenye mkusanyiko wa picha na kuwasimulia kwa vipengele vya maandishi vya hadithi. SANDI inaunganisha alama za kuona, alama zilizotolewa na watumiaji na maarifa ya nyuma, na inatumia programu ya Ujumbe wa Linear kwa ajili ya kuhesabu jukwaa ambazo zina maana ya kimapenzi. Majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa SANDI inaweza kuchagua na kutengeneza picha kwa kutumia maandishi yenye kiwango kikubwa cha kimapenzi.', 'nl': "Het internet bevat een veelheid aan social media posts en andere verhalen waarin tekst wordt afgewisseld met afbeeldingen. In deze contexten worden beelden niet alleen gebruikt voor algemene illustratie, maar worden ze verstandig op bepaalde plekken van een verhaal geplaatst voor multimodale beschrijvingen en vertellingen. In dit werk analyseren we het probleem van tekst-beeld uitlijning, en presenteren we SANDI, een methodologie voor het automatisch selecteren van afbeeldingen uit een beeldverzameling en het uitlijnen ervan met tekstalinea's van een verhaal. SANDI combineert visuele tags, door de gebruiker verstrekte tags en achtergrondkennis en gebruikt een Integer Lineair Programma om semantisch betekenisvolle uitlijningen te berekenen. Experimenten tonen aan dat SANDI afbeeldingen kan selecteren en uitlijnen op teksten met een hoge kwaliteit van semantische pasvorm.", 'hr': 'Internet sadrži mnoge postove društvenih medija i druge priče u kojima se tekst intersperira s slikama. U tim kontekstima, slike se ne koriste samo za opće ilustraciju, već su sudski stavljene na određene mjesta priče za multimodalne opise i priče. U ovom poslu analiziramo problem poravnanja tekstova slika i predstavljamo SANDI, metodologiju za automatski izabranje slika iz kolekcije slika i poravnanje ih tekstskim odstavcima priče. SANDI kombinira vizuelne etikete, korisničke etikete i pozadinske znanje i koristi kompletni linijski program za računalo poravnanja koje su semantički značajne. Eksperimenti pokazuju da SANDI može izabrati i prilagoditi slike tekstima sa visokom kvalitetom semantičkog stanja.', 'tr': "Internetde sosial mediýaly postalar we suratlar bilen terjime edilen hekaýalar bardyr. Şu wagtlar içinde, suratlar diňe umumy surat üçin ulanylmaýar, ýöne adatça bir hekaýanyň birnäçe a ýdyşy we aýdyşy üçin adatça alýarlar. Bu işde biz metin-resim çyzygynyň meselesini analyzýarys we SANDI'i ullanýarys. Resim ýygnagyndan suratlary otomatik seçmek üçin we olaryň metin paragraflary bilen çyzyglaýarys. SANDI görsel tägleri, ullanyşylar temin edilen tägleri we arkaplan bilgileri birleşýär we semantik wajyply tägleri hasaplamak üçin bir Haýyl Hat programini ulanýar Denminatlar SANDI suratlary semantik gabdalyk bilen metinler bilen saýlap we çykaryp biljekdigini görkezýär.", 'am': 'ኢንተርኔት ጽሑፎች በተገኘው ምስሎች ላይ የተደገመ ብዙ የማኅበራዊ አውታር ድምጾች እና ሌሎች ታሪኮች ነበሩት፡፡ በዚህ ሁኔታ፣ ምስሎች ለብሔራዊ ምሳሌ ብቻ አይጠቀሙም፣ ነገር ግን ለብዙኃን ትርጉም እና ትርጉም በተለይ ታሪክ በተደረገ ቦታዎች ላይ ተግባር ይደረጋሉ፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ የጽሑፍ-ምስል ክፍተቶችን እናሳያልን፣ አሁንም SANDI፣ ምስሎችን ከምስል ክፍል በመምረጥ እና ታሪክ ጽሑፍ ክፍሎች እናሳውቃቸዋለን፡፡ SANDI የራእይ ምልክቶች፣ የተጠቃሚ ምልክቶች እና የመደቡን እውቀት ማሰናከል እና የተጠቃሚ የኢንተርኔት Linear ፕሮግራሙን ለመቆጣጠር የሚጠቅመውን አስተያየት፡፡ ከውጭ ምርጫዎች SANDI ምስሎችን በመምረጥ እና በመስመር ላይ በጽሑፎች ከፍ ያለ የsemantic ጥያቄ እንዲያስተካክሉ ያሳያል፡፡', 'fa': 'اینترنت شامل بسیاری از پوست\u200cهای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی و دیگر داستان\u200cهایی است که متن با تصاویر مختلف می\u200cشود. در این موقعیت، تصاویر ساده برای نمایش عمومی استفاده نمی\u200cشوند، بلکه به عدالت در محل\u200cهای تعدادی داستان برای توضیح\u200cهای متعدد و داستان قرار می\u200cگیرند. در این کار ما مشکل تنظیم تصویر متن را تحلیل می\u200cکنیم، و SANDI را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، روش\u200cشناسی برای انتخاب تصویر\u200cهای خود از یک جمع تصویر و تنظیم آن\u200cها با نقطه\u200cهای متن یک داستان. Name تجربه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که SANDI می\u200cتواند تصاویر را با متن\u200cها با کیفیت بالا از مناسب\u200cهای semantic انتخاب و تنظیم کند.', 'hy': 'Ինտերնետը պարունակում է սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների բազմաթիվ տեղադրություններ և այլ պատմություններ, որտեղ տեքստը փոխանցվում է պատկերների հետ: Այս կոնտեքստներում պատկերները ոչ միայն օգտագործվում են ընդհանուր պատկերացումների համար, այլ դատողությամբ տեղադրվում են մի պատմության որոշ կետերում, որտեղ կան բազմամոդալ նկարագրություններ և պատմություններ: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք վերլուծում ենք տեքստի-պատկերի հավասարման խնդիրը և ներկայացնում ենք ՍանդԻ-ը՝ մեթոդոլոգիա պատկերների ավտոմատ ընտրելու համար և դրանք հավասարեցնելու պատմության տեքստի պարագաների հետ: Սանդի համադրում է տեսողական տախտակներ, օգտագործողի տրամադրված տախտակներ և ֆոնդի գիտելիքներ, և օգտագործում է ամբողջ գծային ծրագիր, որպեսզի հաշվարկի սեմանտիկապես իմաստալից հավասարումներ: Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ Սանդի կարող է ընտրել և հարմարեցնել պատկերները սեմանտիկ համապատասխանության բարձր որակի տեքստների հետ:', 'az': "İnternet şəkilləri ilə müxtəlif məlumatlar ilə müxtəlif məlumatların çoxluğu sosyal media məlumatları və digər hekayələri barəsindədir. Bu müxtəliflərdə, görüntülər yalnız nümunə göstərilmək üçün istifadə edilməz, lakin çoxlu modal tərzlərin və hekayələrin bəzi məqamlarında ədalətli yerlərdə yerləşdirilmişdir. Bu işdə mətn-suratı tərəfləndirməsinin problemini analiz edirik və SANDI'yi, surat koleksiyonundan şəkilləri avtomatik seçib mətn paragrafları ilə tərəfləndiririk. SANDI görsel etiketləri, istifadəçilər təyin edilmiş etiketləri və arxa plan bilgiləri birləşdirir və semantik anlamlı tərəfləri hesablamaq üçün Integer Linear Program ını istifadə edir. Həqiqətən, SANDI şəkilləri semantik uyğunluğu ilə yüksək kaliteliylə seçib düzəltə biləcəyini göstərir.", 'af': "Die Internet bevat 'n menigte sosiale media-pos en ander van stories waar teks met beelde onderwerp word. In hierdie kontekste word beelde nie eenvoudig gebruik vir algemene ilustrasie nie, maar word regverdig in sekere plekke van 'n storie vir multimodaale beskrywings en verkenning geplaas. In hierdie werk analyseer ons die probleem van teks-beeldgelyking, en voorsien SANDI, 'n metodologie vir automaties kies beelde van 'n beeldversameling en gelyk hulle met teks paragraaf van 'n storie. Name Eksperimente vertoon dat SANDI beelde kan kies en aligneer met teks met hoë kwaliteit van semantiese pas.", 'sq': 'The Internet contains a multitude of social media posts and other of stories where text is interspersed with images.  In these contexts, images are not simply used for general illustration, but are judiciously placed in certain spots of a story for multimodal descriptions and narration.  Në këtë punë ne analizojmë problemin e përshtatjes tekst-imazhi, dhe prezantojmë SANDI, një metodologi për zgjedhjen automatike të imazheve nga një koleksion imazhesh dhe përshtatjen e tyre me paragrafet teksti të një historie. SANDI kombinon etiketa vizuale, etiketa të dhëna nga përdoruesi dhe njohuri të sfondit dhe përdor një Program Integer Linear për të llogaritur renditje që janë semantikisht të kuptueshme. Eksperimentet tregojnë se SANDI mund të zgjedhë dhe të përshtatet imazhet me tekste me cilësi të lartë të përshtatshme semantike.', 'bn': 'ইন্টারনেটে অনেক সামাজিক মিডিয়া পোস্ট এবং অন্যান্য গল্প রয়েছে যেখানে লেখা ছবির সাথে বন্ধ করা হয়েছে। In these contexts, images are not simply used for general illustration, but are judiciously placed in certain spots of a story for multimodal descriptions and narration.  এই কাজের মধ্যে আমরা টেক্সট-ছবির আকারের সমস্যা বিশ্লেষণ করি, এবং বর্তমানে SANDI, একটি চিত্র সংগ্রহের ছবি স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে নির্বাচনের একটি পদ্ধতি এবং একটি গল্পে SANDI দৃশ্যমান ট্যাগ, ব্যবহারকারী প্রদান করা ট্যাগ এবং পটভূমিকার জ্ঞান সম্মিলন করে এবং প্রোগ্রাম ব্যবহার করে যা অর্থনৈতিক অর্থহীন অংশ হ পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে SANDI টেক্সটের মান উচ্চ মানের সাথে টেক্সট বেছে নিতে পারে এবং তৈরি করতে পারে।', 'cs': 'Internet obsahuje množství příspěvků na sociálních médiích a dalších příběhů, kde je text prosazen obrázky. V těchto souvislostech se obrázky nepoužívají pouze pro obecnou ilustraci, ale jsou rozumně umístěny do určitých míst příběhu pro multimodální popisy a vyprávění. V této práci analyzujeme problém zarovnání textu-obrazu a představujeme metodiku SANDI pro automatický výběr obrázků ze sbírky obrázků a jejich srovnání s textovými odstavci příběhu. SANDI kombinuje vizuální značky, uživatelské značky a znalosti pozadí a používá Integer Lineární Program k výpočtu zarovnání, která jsou sémanticky smysluplná. Experimenty ukazují, že SANDI dokáže vybrat a zarovnat obrázky s texty s vysokou kvalitou sémantického přizpůsobení.', 'bs': 'Internet sadrži mnoge postove društvenih medija i druge priče u kojima se tekst intersperira sa slikama. U tim kontekstima, slike se ne koriste samo za opće ilustraciju, već su sudski stavljene na određene tačke priče za multimodalne opise i priče. U ovom poslu analiziramo problem poravnanja tekstova slika i predstavljamo SANDI, metodologiju za automatski izabranje slika iz kolekcije slika i poravnanje ih tekstskim paragrafama priče. SANDI kombinira vizuelne etikete, etikete pružene korisnikom i pozadinske znanje, i koristi Integer Linear Program da računate poravnanje koje su semantički značajne. Eksperimenti pokazuju da SANDI može izabrati i prilagoditi slike tekstima sa visokom kvalitetom semantičkog stanja.', 'fi': 'Internetissä on paljon sosiaalisen median viestejä ja muita tarinoita, joissa teksti on sekoitettu kuviin. Näissä yhteyksissä kuvia ei käytetä vain yleiseen kuvitukseen, vaan ne sijoitetaan järkevästi tarinan tiettyihin kohtiin multimodaalisia kuvauksia ja kertomuksia varten. Tässä työssä analysoimme tekstin ja kuvan tasauksen ongelmaa ja esittelemme SANDI-menetelmän, jolla kuvat valitaan automaattisesti kuvakokoelmasta ja ne sovitetaan tarinan tekstikappaleiden kanssa. SANDI yhdistää visuaalisia tunnisteita, käyttäjän antamia tunnisteita ja taustatietoa ja käyttää kokonaislinjausohjelmaa semanttisesti merkityksellisten linjausten laskemiseen. Kokeet osoittavat, että SANDI pystyy valitsemaan ja kohdistamaan kuvat tekstien kanssa laadukkaasti semanttisesti.', 'et': 'Internet sisaldab hulgaliselt sotsiaalmeedia postitusi ja muid lugusid, kus tekst on vaheldatud piltidega. Nendes kontekstides ei kasutata pilte lihtsalt üldiseks illustratsiooniks, vaid paigutatakse mõistlikult loo teatud kohtadesse multimodaalsete kirjelduste ja jutustuste jaoks. Käesolevas töös analüüsime teksti-pildi joondamise probleemi ning esitame SANDI-i, metoodikat piltide automaatseks valimiseks pildikogumist ja nende joondamiseks loo tekstilõigetega. SANDI ühendab visuaalsed sildid, kasutaja poolt pakutavad sildid ja taustateadmised ning kasutab semantiliselt tähenduslike joonduste arvutamiseks terviklineaarprogrammi. Eksperimentid näitavad, et SANDI suudab valida ja joondada pilte tekstidega kvaliteetse semantilise sobivusega.', 'ca': "Internet conté moltes publicacions dels mitjans socials i altres d'històries on el text està intersperat amb imatges. En aquests contextos, les imatges no són simplement utilitzades per il·lustració general, sinó en certs llocs d'una història per descripcions multimodals i narracions. En aquesta feina analitzem el problem a de l'alliniament entre text i imatge, i presentem SANDI, una metodologia per seleccionar automàticament imatges d'una col·lecció d'imatges i allinjar-les amb paràgrafs de text d'una història. SANDI combina etiquetes visuals, etiquetes proporcionades per l'usuari i coneixements de fons, i utilitza un Programa Llinear Integer per calcular alliniaments semànticament significatius. Els experiments demostren que SANDI pot seleccionar i allinjar imatges amb textos d'alta qualitat d'aptitud semàntica.", 'ha': "Intanet yana da wasu makala mãsu yawa na mitandai da jamii da wasu hadiyado da aka samu marubũta da zane. Daga wannan muhalli, ba za'a yi amfani ba da zanen su zama kawai wa misãlai guda, kuma amma an daidaita su cikin wurãre fulani na wani lãbãri wa misãlai masu multi-mutane da bakin faɗi. In this work we analyze the problem of text-image alignment, and present SANDI, a methodology for automatically selecting images from an image collection and aligning them with text paragraphs of a story.  SANDi na haɗa tagogi masu gani, tagogi da aka bai wa mai amfani da shi da kuma ilmi na bango, kuma yana amfani da Shirin Linke na Intara dõmin ya yi lissafi ga juyin tsohon da ke da kima mai amfani da. Tajarakin na nuna cewa SANDi na iya zãɓi da zane masu daidaita da matsayin da tsari mai tsawo na semantic.", 'jv': 'Internet nduwe akeh akeh akeh basa media sampeyan lan akeh basa sing oleh dumadhan karo gambar. Diwangi iki, gambar kuwi ora seneng nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan, pero perusahaan langkung pakan liyane karo perusahaan banget kanggo kegangasahan karo akeh multimodal kapan karo kapan-kapan. Nang gawar iki, kita diwubah perusahaan nggawe Gambar luwih-luwih nggawe gambar textattr STANDI first Name', 'he': 'האינטרנט מכיל המון פרסומות של תקשורת חברתית ואחרים של סיפורים שבו טקסט משתלב עם תמונות. בתוך הקונקסטים האלה, תמונות לא משתמשות בלבד לתארות כללית, אלא מוקמות בצורה שופטית במקומות מסויימים של סיפור לתיאורים ומספרים רבים. בעבודה הזו אנו מנתחים את הבעיה של התאמת טקסט-תמונה, ומציגים SANDI, מטודולוגיה לבחירה אוטומטית תמונות מאוסף תמונות ומאמינים אותם עם פסקי טקסט של סיפור. SANDI combines visual tags, user-provided tags and background knowledge, and uses an Integer Linear Program to compute alignments that are semantically meaningful.  ניסויים מראים שSANDI יכול לבחור ולהתאים תמונות עם טקסטים עם איכות גבוהה של התאמה סמנטית.', 'sk': 'Internet vsebuje številne objave v družbenih medijih in druge zgodbe, kjer je besedilo prepleteno s slikami. V teh kontekstih se slike ne uporabljajo zgolj za splošno ilustracijo, temveč so premišljeno postavljene na določene točke zgodbe za multimodalne opise in pripovedovanje. V tem delu analiziramo problem poravnave besedila-slike in predstavimo SANDI, metodologijo za samodejno izbiro slik iz zbirke slik in njihovo poravnavo z besedilnimi odstavki zgodbe. SANDI združuje vizualne oznake, oznake, ki jih zagotavljajo uporabniki, in znanje ozadja ter uporablja celotni linearni program za izračun poravnave, ki so semantično pomembne. Poskusi kažejo, da lahko SANDI izbere in uskladi slike z besedili z visoko kakovostjo semantičnega prileganja.', 'bo': 'དྲ་རྒྱའི་ནང་དུ་ཡི་གེའི་བརྙན་རིས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ དེའི་གནས་སྟངས་འདི་དག་ལ་བརྙན་རིས་རྣམས་མེད་པར་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་ཡིན་ནའང་ཡང་མེད་པར། ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གྲལ་སྒྲིག་གི་དཀའ་ངལ SANDI combines visual tags, user-provided tags and background knowledge, and uses an Integer Linear Program to compute alignments that are semantically meaningful. བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱས་ན། SANDI རྣམ་པ་ལ་ཚིག་ཡིག་དང་ཕྱོགས་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པའི་ཚིག་ཡིག་དང་མཐུན་བཟོ་ཐུབ་པ'}
{'en': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favor : Code-switching in Task-oriented Semantic Parsing', 'es': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favor: Cambio de código en el análisis semántico orientado a tareas', 'fr': "El Volumen Louder Por Favor\xa0: Changement de code dans l'analyse sémantique orientée tâches", 'ar': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favor: تبديل الشفرة في التحليل الدلالي الموجه نحو المهام', 'pt': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favor: Comutação de código na análise semântica orientada a tarefas', 'zh': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favor:语义解析代码切换', 'ja': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favor:タスク指向のセマンティック構文解析におけるコードスイッチング', 'ru': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favor: Переключение кода в семантическом разборе, ориентированном на задачу', 'ga': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favor: Cód-athrú i bParsáil Shéimeantach atá Dírithe ar Thasc', 'hi': 'एल Volumen लाउडर पोर एहसान: कार्य उन्मुख शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग में कोड स्विचिंग', 'hu': 'El Volumen Hangosabb Por Favor: Kódváltás feladatorientált szemantikus értelmezésben', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favor: Cambiamento di codice in Task-oriented Semantic Parsing', 'el': 'Ο όγκος δυνατότερος και ευνοϊκότερος: Αλλαγή κώδικα στη σημασιολογική ανάλυση προσανατολισμένη στην εργασία', 'kk': 'Ель дыбыс көлемі үлкен пор жақсы: Тапсырма бағытталған біртінші талдау кодын ауыстыру', 'lt': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favor: Code-switching in Task-oriented Semantic Parsing', 'ml': 'എല്\u200d വോളുമിന്\u200d ഉറക്കം പോര്\u200d പ്രിയപ്പെട്ട: ജോലിയുടെ കോഡ് മാറ്റുന്ന സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങില്\u200d', 'ms': 'Kegemaran Volumen El Louder Por: Penukaran-kod dalam Penghuraian Semantik Berorientasi-Tugas', 'mk': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favor: Премена на кодови во семантичното анализирање ориентирано на задачите', 'mt': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favorit: Il-bidla tal-kodiċi fil-proċess ta’ analiżi Semantika orjentat lejn ix-xogħol', 'mn': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favor: Code-switching in Task-oriented Semantic Parsing', 'no': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favor: Byt koden i semiantisk tolking med oppgåver orientert', 'ro': 'Volumen Louder Por Favor: Schimbarea codului în parsarea semantică orientată spre sarcini', 'pl': 'Przełączanie kodu w procesie analizowania semantycznego zorientowanego na zadania', 'sr': 'El Volumen Glasniji Por Favor: Prebacivanje šifre u semiantičkom ispitivanju na zadatku', 'si': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favorite: Code- changing in Job- orient semantic Parsing', 'so': 'Qoraalka codka ee El Volume: Codsiga beddelinta ee jardiinada shaqada-oriented Semantic', 'sv': 'Volumen Högre För Favor: Kodväxling i uppgiftsorienterad semantisk tolkning', 'ta': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favor: Code-switching in Task-oriented Semantic Parsing', 'ur': 'ال وولومین زیادہ زبان پور فائر: کوڈ-سوچ ٹاکس-oriented Semantic Parsing میں', 'uz': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favor: Code-switching in Task-oriented Semantic Parsing', 'vi': 'Comment=Chim cánh cụt Comment=Chim cánh cụt Comment', 'hr': 'El Volumen Glasniji Por Favor: Promjena šifre u semiantičkom ispitivanju na zadatku', 'bg': 'Превключване на кодове в семантично анализиране, ориентирано към задачите', 'nl': 'El Volume Louder Por Favor: Code-switching in Taakgerichte Semantische Parsing', 'da': 'El Volumen højere Por Favor: Kodeskift i Opgaveorienteret Semantic Parsing', 'ko': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favor: 작업에 대한 의미 분석에서의 코드 변환', 'fa': 'الVolumen Lour Por Favor: Switch Code in Task-oriented Semantic Parsing', 'id': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favor: Pertukaran kode dalam Analisasi Semantik Orientasi Tugas', 'de': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favor: Code-Switching in Task-Oriented Semantic Parsing', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Upendekezo wa Sauti ya Volume: Kubadilishwa kwa sheria katika Umbuzi wa Semantic unaoongozwa na kazi', 'hy': 'Էլ Ձայնագրությունը բարձրաձայն Փորֆորն է. Գործիքների փոխման գործընթացքում', 'az': 'El Volumen Daha y칲ks톛k Por Favori: G칬z톛l-oriented Semantic Parsing', 'sq': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favor: Code-switching in Task-oriented Semantic Parsing', 'am': 'የዶሴ ስም፦', 'bn': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favor: Code-switching in Task-oriented Semantic Parsing', 'tr': 'Sesi Daha Gatyr Por Favorit: Kod-switching in Task-oriented Semantic Parsing', 'ca': "El Volumen Louder Por Favor: Cambiar de codi en l'analització Semàtica orientada a les tasques", 'fi': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favor: Koodin vaihtaminen tehtäväkeskeisessä semanttisessa jäsentelyssä', 'bs': 'El Volumen Glasniji Por Favor: Promjena šifre u semiantičkom ispitivanju na zadatku', 'cs': 'Hlas Por Favor: Přepínání kódu v úlohově orientovaném sémantickém parsování', 'et': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favor: Koodi vahetamine ülesandepõhises semantilises parsimises', 'he': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favor: החלפת קודים במחקר סמנטי ממוקד למשימות', 'sk': 'Po priljubljenosti: Preklapljanje kod v semantičnem razpravljanju, usmerjenem v opravila', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'object', 'bo': 'El Volumen Louder Por Favor: Code-switching in Task-oriented Semantic Parsing'}
{'en': 'Being able to parse code-switched (CS) utterances, such as Spanish+English or Hindi+English, is essential to democratize task-oriented semantic parsing systems for certain locales. In this work, we focus on Spanglish (Spanish+English) and release a dataset, CSTOP, containing 5800 CS utterances alongside their semantic parses. We examine the CS generalizability of various Cross-lingual (XL) models and exhibit the advantage of pre-trained XL language models when data for only one language is present. As such, we focus on improving the pre-trained models for the case when only English corpus alongside either zero or a few CS training instances are available. We propose two data augmentation methods for the zero-shot and the few-shot settings : fine-tune using translate-and-align and augment using a generation model followed by match-and-filter. Combining the few-shot setting with the above improvements decreases the initial 30-point accuracy gap between the zero-shot and the full-data settings by two thirds.', 'ar': 'تعد القدرة على تحليل الألفاظ بتبديل الشفرات (CS) ، مثل الإسبانية + الإنجليزية أو الهندية + الإنجليزية ، أمرًا ضروريًا لإضفاء الطابع الديمقراطي على أنظمة التحليل الدلالي الموجهة نحو المهام لبعض المناطق. في هذا العمل ، نركز على Spanglish (الإسبانية + الإنجليزية) ونصدر مجموعة بيانات ، CSTOP ، تحتوي على 5800 كلمة CS جنبًا إلى جنب مع تحليلها الدلالي. ندرس قابلية تعميم CS على نماذج متعددة اللغات (XL) ونعرض ميزة نماذج لغة XL المدربة مسبقًا عند وجود بيانات للغة واحدة فقط. على هذا النحو ، فإننا نركز على تحسين النماذج المدربة مسبقًا للحالة عندما تتوفر فقط مجموعة مواد اللغة الإنجليزية جنبًا إلى جنب مع صفر أو عدد قليل من حالات تدريب CS. نقترح طريقتين لزيادة البيانات للإعدادات ذات اللقطة الصفرية واللقطات القليلة: الضبط الدقيق باستخدام الترجمة والمحاذاة والزيادة باستخدام نموذج جيل متبوعًا بالمطابقة والتصفية. يؤدي الجمع بين إعداد اللقطات القليلة والتحسينات المذكورة أعلاه إلى تقليل فجوة الدقة الأولية البالغة 30 نقطة بين إعدادات اللقطة الصفرية والبيانات الكاملة بمقدار الثلثين.', 'fr': "Pouvoir analyser des énoncés à commutation de code (CS), tels que l'espagnol+anglais ou l'hindi+anglais, est essentiel pour démocratiser les systèmes d'analyse sémantique orientés vers les tâches pour certains paramètres régionaux. Dans ce travail, nous nous concentrons sur le spanglish (espagnol+anglais) et publions un jeu de données, CSTOP, contenant 5800 énoncés CS ainsi que leurs analyses sémantiques. Nous examinons la généralisabilité CS de divers modèles multilingues (XL) et montrons l'avantage des modèles de langage XL préformés lorsque des données pour une seule langue sont présentes. En tant que tels, nous nous concentrons sur l'amélioration des modèles pré-formés pour les cas où seuls des corpus anglais sont disponibles à côté de zéro ou de quelques instances de formation CS. Nous proposons deux méthodes d'augmentation des données pour les paramètres de tir zéro et de tir réduit\xa0: affiner à l'aide de la translation et de l'alignement et augmenter à l'aide d'un modèle de génération suivi d'une correspondance et d'un filtre. La combinaison du réglage de quelques prises avec les améliorations ci-dessus réduit de deux tiers l'écart de précision initial de 30 points entre le réglage de tir zéro et les paramètres de données complètes.", 'es': 'Ser capaz de analizar enunciados con conmutación de código (CS), como español+inglés o hindi+inglés, es esencial para democratizar los sistemas de análisis semántico orientados a tareas para ciertas configuraciones regionales. En este trabajo, nos centramos en el spanglish (español+inglés) y publicamos un conjunto de datos, CSTOP, que contiene 5800 enunciados CS junto con sus análisis semánticos. Examinamos la generalización CS de varios modelos multilingües (XL) y mostramos la ventaja de los modelos lingüísticos XL previamente entrenados cuando solo hay datos para un idioma. Como tal, nos centramos en mejorar los modelos preentrenados para el caso en que solo están disponibles el corpus en inglés junto con cero o unas pocas instancias de capacitación en informática. Proponemos dos métodos de aumento de datos para la configuración de tiro cero y de pocos disparos: ajuste fino con traducir y alinear y aumentar con un modelo de generación seguido de coincidencia y filtro. La combinación de la configuración de pocos disparos con las mejoras anteriores reduce en dos tercios la diferencia inicial de precisión de 30 puntos entre la configuración de tiro cero y la configuración de datos completos.', 'pt': 'Ser capaz de analisar enunciados comutados por código (CS), como espanhol+inglês ou hindi+inglês, é essencial para democratizar os sistemas de análise semântica orientados a tarefas para determinadas localidades. Neste trabalho, focamos no espanglês (espanhol+inglês) e lançamos um conjunto de dados, CSTOP, contendo 5800 enunciados CS ao lado de suas análises semânticas. Examinamos a generalização CS de vários modelos Cross-lingual (XL) e exibimos a vantagem de modelos de linguagem XL pré-treinados quando os dados para apenas um idioma estão presentes. Como tal, nos concentramos em melhorar os modelos pré-treinados para o caso em que apenas o corpus em inglês ao lado de zero ou algumas instâncias de treinamento de CS estão disponíveis. Propomos dois métodos de aumento de dados para as configurações de tiro zero e de poucos tiros: ajuste fino usando traduzir e alinhar e aumentar usando um modelo de geração seguido por correspondência e filtro. A combinação da configuração de poucos disparos com as melhorias acima diminui a diferença inicial de precisão de 30 pontos entre as configurações de disparo zero e de dados completos em dois terços.', 'zh': '能解析代码切换 (CS) 言(如西班牙语+英语若印地语+英语)之于设域者语义析其统民主化至重。 注意于西班牙语(西班牙语+英语),发数集CSTOP,含5800CS语及语义解析。 论诸语言(XL)CS可广性,并存一言之数,开预练之XL。 故专注于改进预练模形,以防惟英语语料库及零个或数 CS 练例可用。 为零次少设二法:微平移齐,以成模形,然后匹配漉。 少射置合之,零射全数初30差减三分之二。', 'ru': 'Возможность синтаксического анализа фраз с переключением кода (CS), таких как испанский+английский или хинди+английский, имеет важное значение для демократизации систем семантического синтаксического анализа, ориентированных на решение задач, для определенных локалей. В этой работе мы фокусируемся на Spanglish (испанский+английский) и выпускаем набор данных, CSTOP, содержащий 5800 CS высказываний наряду с их семантическими разборами. Мы изучаем обобщаемость CS различных кросс-лингвистических (XL) моделей и демонстрируем преимущество предварительно обученных языковых моделей XL при наличии данных только для одного языка. Таким образом, мы сосредоточены на улучшении предварительно подготовленных моделей для случая, когда доступна только английская версия наряду с нулем или несколькими учебными мероприятиями CS. Мы предлагаем два метода увеличения данных для настроек нулевого снимка и нескольких снимков: точная настройка с использованием функции translate-and-align и увеличение с использованием модели генерации с последующим сопоставлением и фильтром. Сочетание настроек с небольшим количеством выстрелов с вышеуказанными улучшениями уменьшает первоначальный 30-точечный разрыв в точности между настройками с нулевым выстрелом и полными данными на две трети.', 'ja': 'スペイン語+英語またはヒンディー語+英語などのコードスイッチ（ CS ）発話を解析できることは、特定のロケールのタスク指向のセマンティック解析システムを民主化するために不可欠です。 この作業では、Spanglish （スペイン語+英語）に焦点を当て、セマンティックパースとともに5800のCS発話を含むデータセットCSTOPをリリースします。 私たちは、さまざまなクロスリンガル（ XL ）モデルのCSの一般化性を検討し、1つの言語のみのデータが存在する場合、事前にトレーニングされたXL言語モデルの利点を示します。 したがって、私たちは、ゼロまたはいくつかのCSトレーニングインスタンスと共に英語コーパスのみが利用可能な場合の事前トレーニングモデルの改善に焦点を当てています。 ゼロショットと数ショット設定の2つのデータ拡張方法を提案します。Translate - and - alignを使用して微調整し、マッチアンドフィルタを使用して生成モデルを使用して拡張します。 ゼロショット設定と上記の改善を組み合わせると、ゼロショット設定とフルデータ設定の間の初期30ポイントの精度ギャップが3分の2減少します。', 'hi': 'कोड-स्विच्ड (सीएस) उच्चारण, जैसे स्पेनिश + अंग्रेजी या हिंदी + अंग्रेजी को पार्स करने में सक्षम होने के नाते, कुछ स्थानों के लिए कार्य-उन्मुख शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग सिस्टम को लोकतांत्रिक बनाने के लिए आवश्यक है। इस काम में, हम स्पैंगलिश (स्पेनिश + अंग्रेजी) पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं और एक डेटासेट, सीएसटीओपी जारी करते हैं, जिसमें उनके शब्दार्थ पार्स के साथ 5800 सीएस उच्चारण होते हैं। हम विभिन्न क्रॉस-भाषी (एक्सएल) मॉडल की सीएस सामान्यता की जांच करते हैं और पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित एक्सएल भाषा मॉडल के लाभ को प्रदर्शित करते हैं जब केवल एक भाषा के लिए डेटा मौजूद होता है। इस प्रकार, हम इस मामले के लिए पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित मॉडल में सुधार करने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं जब शून्य या कुछ सीएस प्रशिक्षण उदाहरणों के साथ केवल अंग्रेजी कॉर्पस उपलब्ध होते हैं। हम शून्य-शॉट और कुछ-शॉट सेटिंग्स के लिए दो डेटा संवर्धन विधियों का प्रस्ताव करते हैं: अनुवाद-और-संरेखित का उपयोग करके ठीक-ट्यून और मैच-एंड-फ़िल्टर के बाद एक पीढ़ी के मॉडल का उपयोग करके बढ़ाएं। उपरोक्त सुधारों के साथ कुछ-शॉट सेटिंग का संयोजन शून्य-शॉट और पूर्ण-डेटा सेटिंग्स के बीच प्रारंभिक 30-बिंदु सटीकता अंतर को दो तिहाई तक कम कर देता है।', 'ga': 'Tá sé ríthábhachtach go mbeifeá in ann cainteanna cód-aistrithe (CS) a pharsáil, mar shampla Spáinnis+Béarla nó Hiondúis+Béarla, chun córais pharsála shéimeantacha tasc-dhírithe a dhaonlathú do logaí áirithe. San obair seo, dírímid ar Spanglish (Spáinnis + Béarla) agus eisímid tacar sonraí, CSTOP, ina bhfuil 5800 focal CS taobh lena pharsanna shéimeantacha. Scrúdaímid ginearálú CS múnlaí éagsúla Trasteangacha (XL) agus léirímid an buntáiste a bhaineann le samhlacha teanga XL réamh-oilte nuair nach bhfuil ach sonraí do theanga amháin i láthair. Mar sin, dírímid ar na samhlacha réamhoilte a fheabhsú do chás nach bhfuil ach corpas Béarla ar fáil taobh le nialas nó cúpla cás oiliúna CS. Molaimid dhá mhodh méadaithe sonraí don seat náid agus do na socruithe cúpla seat: mionchoigeartú ag baint úsáide as aistriú-agus-ailíniú agus cur leis ag baint úsáide as samhail giniúna agus meaitseáil agus scagaire ina dhiaidh sin. Má chomhcheanglaítear an socrú cúpla lámhaigh leis na feabhsuithe thuas, laghdaítear an bhearna chruinnis tosaigh 30 pointe idir an seat náid agus na socruithe sonraí iomlána faoi dhá thrian.', 'ka': 'კოდის გადაცვლა (CS) სიტყვები, როგორც სპანელი+ინგლისური ან ინგლისური+ინგლისური, უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, რომ დემოკრატიზაციას დავამუშავებთ დავამუშავებული საქმენტიკური გან ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ შანგლისური (შანგლისური+ანგლისური) და მონაცემები CSTOP-ს გახსნა, რომელიც 5800 CS სიტყვების სიმპანტიკური პარასების დამატებით აქვს. ჩვენ CS-ს განსხვავებული კრისტენგური (XL) მოდელების გენერალური შესაძლებლობა გავუკვირდებით და გამოყენებით წინ განსწავლებული XL ენის მოდელების მოსაძლებლობა, როცა მხოლოდ ერთი ენის მონაც როგორც ასე, ჩვენ კონუქტირებით გავაკეთებთ მოდელების უფრო მეტადებაზე, როდესაც მხოლოდ ანგლისური კორპუსი ნულ ან რამდენიმე CS-ის განაკეთება მოხდა. ჩვენ ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ ორი მონაცემების აგგენტირების მეტოვები ნულ-სტატის და რამდენიმე სტატის პარამეტრებისთვის: fine-tune გამოყენებული translate-and-align და augment გამოყენებული მოდელის გამოყენ ჩემი წინაღალდების შესაძლებლობით, რომელიც შესაძლებელია, დასაწყებლად, დასაწყებლად სამუშაო 30 წერტილის წინაღალდეობის განსხვავება ნულ სტატის შორის და სამუშაო', 'el': 'Η δυνατότητα ανάλυσης εκφράσεων μεταγωγής κώδικα (CS), όπως Ισπανικά+Αγγλικά ή Χίντι+Αγγλικά, είναι απαραίτητη για τον εκδημοκρατισμό συστημάτων σημασιολογικής ανάλυσης για ορισμένες περιοχές. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εστιάζουμε στα ισπανικά (ισπανικά+αγγλικά) και απελευθερώνουμε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων, το CSTOP, που περιέχει εκφάνσεις 5800 CS παράλληλα με τις σημασιολογικές αναλύσεις τους. Εξετάζουμε τη γενικότητα των διαφόρων διαγώνινων μοντέλων (και επιδεικνύουμε το πλεονέκτημα των προ-εκπαιδευμένων γλωσσικών μοντέλων όταν υπάρχουν δεδομένα μόνο για μια γλώσσα. Ως εκ τούτου, εστιάζουμε στη βελτίωση των προ-εκπαιδευμένων μοντέλων για την περίπτωση που είναι διαθέσιμα μόνο το αγγλικό σώμα μαζί με το μηδέν ή μερικές περιπτώσεις εκπαίδευσης CS. Προτείνουμε δύο μεθόδους αύξησης δεδομένων για τις ρυθμίσεις μηδενικού πυροβολισμού και λίγων πυροβολισμών: συντονισμός με τη χρήση μετάφρασης-ευθυγράμμισης και αύξηση χρησιμοποιώντας ένα μοντέλο παραγωγής που ακολουθείται από αντιστοίχιση και φίλτρο. Ο συνδυασμός της ρύθμισης λίγων βολών με τις παραπάνω βελτιώσεις μειώνει το αρχικό χάσμα ακρίβειας 30-σημείων μεταξύ των ρυθμίσεων μηδενικής βολής και των ρυθμίσεων πλήρους δεδομένων κατά δύο τρίτα.', 'hu': 'A kódkapcsolt (CS) kifejezések, mint például a spanyol+angol vagy hindi+angol elemzése elengedhetetlen a feladatorientált szemantikai elemzési rendszerek demokratizálásához bizonyos területeken. Ebben a munkában a spanyol (spanyol+angol) nyelvre összpontosítunk, és kiadunk egy adatkészletet, a CSTOP-ot, amely 5800 CS kifejezést tartalmaz a szemantikai elemzések mellett. Vizsgáljuk a különböző Cross-lingual (XL) modellek CS általánosíthatóságát, és bemutatjuk az előre képzett XL nyelvi modellek előnyeit, ha csak egy nyelvre vonatkozó adatok vannak jelen. Ennek megfelelően arra összpontosítunk, hogy fejlesszük az előre képzett modelleket, amikor csak angol korpusz áll rendelkezésre a nulla vagy néhány CS képzési példány mellett. Két adatbővítési módszert javasolunk a zero-shot és a kevés-shot beállításokhoz: finomhangolás translate-and-align segítségével és augment generációs modell segítségével, amelyet match-and-filter követ. A néhány felvételi beállítás és a fenti fejlesztések kombinációja kétharmaddal csökkenti a kezdeti 30 pontos pontossági rést a nulla felvételi és a teljes adat beállítások között.', 'it': "Essere in grado di analizzare espressioni a commutazione di codice (CS), come spagnolo + inglese o hindi + inglese, è essenziale per democratizzare i sistemi di analisi semantica orientata ai compiti per determinate località. In questo lavoro, ci concentriamo sullo spagnolo (spagnolo + inglese) e rilasciamo un dataset, CSTOP, contenente 5800 parole CS insieme ai loro parsi semantici. Esaminiamo la generalizzabilità CS di vari modelli Cross-lingual (XL) e mostriamo il vantaggio di modelli di lingua XL pre-addestrati quando sono presenti dati per una sola lingua. Pertanto, ci concentriamo sul miglioramento dei modelli pre-addestrati per il caso in cui solo corpus inglese insieme a zero o poche istanze di formazione CS sono disponibili. Proponiamo due metodi di aumento dei dati per le impostazioni zero-shot e pochi-shot: sintonizzare con precisione utilizzando translate-and-align e augment utilizzando un modello di generazione seguito da match-and-filter. Combinando l'impostazione dei pochi scatti con i miglioramenti di cui sopra, il divario iniziale di precisione di 30 punti tra le impostazioni dello zero-shot e quelle dei dati completi diminuisce di due terzi.", 'mk': 'За демократизација на системите за семантично анализирање ориентирани на задачите е суштинско да се анализираат изразите со код (CS), како што се шпански+англиски или хинди+англиски. In this work, we focus on Spanglish (Spanish+English) and release a dataset, CSTOP, containing 5800 CS utterances alongside their semantic parses.  Ние ја испитуваме генерализацијата на CS на различните крстојазични (XL) модели и ја изложуваме предноста од предобучени XL јазични модели кога се присутни податоци за само еден јазик. Како таква, се фокусираме на подобрување на предобучените модели за случајот кога се достапни само англиски корпус заедно со нула или неколку случаи на обука на ЦС. Предложуваме два методи за зголемување на податоците за поставувањата со нула-снимка и неколку снимки: фино прилагодување користејќи превод-и-излагодување и зголемување користејќи генерациски модел следен од matching-and-filter. Комбинирањето на поставувањата со неколку снимки со наведените подобрувања ја намалува првичната 30-точна прецизност меѓу поставувањата со нула снимка и поставувањата со целосни податоци за две третини.', 'kk': 'Код ауыстырылған (CS) сөздерді, испан+ағылшын немесе хинди+ағылшын секілді, демократизациялау үшін кейбір жергіліктер үшін тапсырманың бағытталған семантикалық талдау жүйелерін үшін маңызды. Бұл жұмыс ішінде Спанглиз (испан+ағылшын) тізіміне назар аударып, олардың семантикалық талдауындағы 5800 CS сөздерін қолданып, деректер жинағын CSTOP ашып шығаруға болады. Біз CS жалпы тілді (XL) моделдерін тексереміз және тек бір тіл үшін деректер бар кезде, алдындағы XL тіл моделдерінің артықшылығын көрсетеді. Бұл үшін біз тек нөл немесе бірнеше CS оқыту инстанцияларының жағындағы ағылшын корпус үлгілерін жақсарту үшін көңіл береміз. Біз Null- shot және кейбір түрлендіру параметрлерінің екі деректерді көбейту әдістерін ұсынамыз: translate- and- align және augment үлгісін қолдану үлгісімен сүзгілерді қолдану үлгісін қолданады. Жоғардағы жақсартуларды біріктіру үшін бірнеше сүру параметрлері нөл сүру мен толық деректер параметрлері арасындағы бастапқы 30 нүктің дұрыстығын екі үшін азайтады.', 'ms': 'Membolehkan hurai ungkapan-kod-ditukar (CS), seperti bahasa Sepanyol+Inggeris atau Hindi+Inggeris, adalah penting untuk demokratisasikan sistem hurai semantik orientasi tugas untuk tempatan tertentu. Dalam kerja ini, kami fokus pada Spanglish (Spanyol+Inggeris) dan melepaskan set data, CSTOP, yang mengandungi 5800 ucapan CS di samping huraian semantik mereka. We examine the CS generalizability of various Cross-lingual (XL) models and exhibit the advantage of pre-trained XL language models when data for only one language is present.  Sebagai demikian, kita fokus pada memperbaiki model pra-dilatih untuk kes apabila hanya korpus Inggeris bersama sama ada sifar atau beberapa kes pelatihan CS tersedia. We propose two data augmentation methods for the zero-shot and the few-shot settings: fine-tune using translate-and-align and augment using a generation model followed by match-and-filter.  Menggabungkan tetapan beberapa-tembakan dengan peningkatan di atas mengurangkan jarak akurasi awal 30-titik antara tetapan 0-tembakan dan data penuh dengan dua pertiga.', 'lt': 'Siekiant demokratizuoti užduotims orientuotas semantines analizavimo sistemas tam tikroms vietos vietovėms, būtina paruošti kodais pakeistus (CS) išrašus, pavyzdžiui, ispanų+anglų arba Hindi+anglų. Šiame darbe daugiausia dėmesio skiriame ispanų kalbai (ispanų ir anglų kalbomis) ir paskelbiame duomenų rinkinį, CSTOP, kuriame kartu su jų semantiniais tyrimais yra 5800 CS išraiškų. Nagrinėdami įvairių daugiakalbių (XL) modelių CS generalizavimą, iš anksto parengtų XL kalbų modelių privalumai rodomi, kai yra tik vienos kalbos duomenų. Todėl daugiausia dėmesio skiriame išankstinio mokymo modelių tobulinimui atvejui, kai tik anglų korpusas yra prieinamas kartu su nuliu arba keletu CS mokymo atvejų. Siūlome du duomenų didinimo metodus nulinio ir kelių nuotraukų nustatymui: tiksliai pritaikyti vertimo ir suderinimo metodus ir padidinti naudojant kartos model į, po kurio eina atitiktis ir filtras. Mažo nuotraukos nustatymo derinys su pirmiau minėtais patobulinimais sumažina pradinę 30 taškų tikslumo spragą tarp nulinio nuotraukos nustatymo ir išsamių duomenų nustatymo dviem trečdaliais.', 'ml': 'സ്പാനിഷ്+ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ഹിന്ദി+ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പോലുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d പാര്\u200dസ് ചെയ്യുവാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നത് കോഡ്- മാറ്റുവാന്\u200d സാധിക്കു ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സ്പാങ്ങിഷില്\u200d (സ്പാനിഷ്+ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്) നേരെ ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുകയും, അവയുടെ സെമാന്\u200dറിക് പാര്\u200dസുകളോടൊപ്പം 5800 എസ് എസ് വാക വ്യത്യസ്ത ക്രോസ്- ലാങ്കുകളുടെ (XL) മോഡലുകളുടെ CS സാധാരണ പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ഭാഷയില്\u200d മാത്രം മാത്രം പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട എക്സ്\u200cഎല്\u200d ഭ അതുപോലെ, നമ്മള്\u200d കേസിന് മുമ്പ് പരിശീലന മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നതിനായി ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് മാത്രമേ പൂജ പൂജ്യത്തിനും ചില വെടിയുടെ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും രണ്ട് ഡേറ്റാ കൂട്ടുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു മുകളിലുള്ള മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനൊപ്പം കുറച്ച് വെടിവെക്കുന്ന കുറച്ച് വെടിയുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. പൂജ്യത്തിന്റെ വെടിവെ', 'mn': 'Код өөрчлөгдсөн (CS) хэлний талаар шинжилж чадах нь Испан+Англи, хинди+Англи гэх мэт, зарим орон нутгийн ажил дээр зориулагдсан семантик хуваалцах системийг ардчилсан чухал юм. Энэ ажил дээр бид Спанглис (Испан+Англи) дээр анхаарлаа хандуулж өгөгдлийн санг CSTOP гаргаж, 5800 CS илтгэлийг тэдний semantic parses-ээс хамтдаа оруулж байна. Бид CS-г олон Холон хэл загварын ерөнхийлөгч чадварыг шалгаж, зөвхөн нэг хэл дээр өгөгдлийн талаар сургалтын өмнө сургалтын XL хэл загварын ашиг үзүүлдэг. Иймээс бид англи корпус зөвхөн 0 эсвэл хэдэн CS дасгал сургалтын тохиолдлын тохиолдлыг сайжруулахад анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Бид хоёр өгөгдлийн нэмэлт арга загварыг зөвшөөрөх болон хэдэн зурагтай тохируулах арга загварыг санал болгож байна: translate-and-align, increase using a generation model followed by match-and-filter. Хэдхэн зураг дээрх сайжруулалтыг холбох нь эхний 30 цэгийн тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолтын ялгааг 0 цэг болон бүрэн өгөгдлийн тодорхойлолтын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолтын хо', 'no': 'Det er nødvendig å tolka uttrykk med kodbytt (CS), slik som spansk + engelsk eller hindisk + engelsk, for å demokratisera semantiske tolkingssystemer med oppgåva orientert for nokre lokale lokale. I denne arbeida fokuserer vi på Spanglish (spansk + engelsk) og løyser ein dataset, CSTOP, som inneheld 5800 CS- uttrykk blant sine semantiske tolkingar. Vi undersøker CS-generelliserbarheten av ulike krysspråk (XL) modeller og viser fordel av først trengte XL språk-modeller når data for berre eitt språk finst. Som slik, fokuserer vi på å forbetra føretrainerte modeller for tilfellet når berre engelsk korpus blant enten null eller noen CS- treningsinstansar er tilgjengelege. Vi foreslår to data-augmentasjonsmetodar for innstillingane for null-bilete og få-bilete: fine-tune med translate-and-align and augment using a generation model followed by match-and-filter. Kombinert innstillingane for få bilete med forbetringane over, reduserer den første avstanden for nøyaktighet på 30 punkt mellom nullbiletet og heile datainnstillingane med to tredeler.', 'pl': 'Umiejętność analizowania wypowiedzi przełączonych kodem (CS), takich jak hiszpański+angielski lub hindi+angielski, jest niezbędna do demokratyzacji systemów analizy semantycznej dla określonych lokalizacji. W niniejszej pracy skupiamy się na spanglish (hiszpański+angielski) i wydajemy zbiór danych CSTOP, zawierający wypowiedzi 5800 CS wraz z ich parsami semantycznymi. Badamy uogólnialność CS różnych modeli cross-lingual (XL) i wykazujemy zaletę wstępnie przeszkolonych modeli językowych XL, gdy obecne są dane tylko dla jednego języka. W związku z tym skupiamy się na ulepszaniu wstępnie przeszkolonych modeli dla przypadku, gdy dostępny jest tylko korpus angielski obok zera lub kilku instancji szkoleniowych CS. Proponujemy dwie metody powiększania danych dla ustawień zero-shot i kilku-shot: precyzyjne dostrojenie za pomocą translate-and-align oraz rozszerzenie za pomocą modelu generacyjnego, po którym następuje dopasowanie i filtr. Połączenie ustawienia kilku strzałów z powyższymi ulepszeniami zmniejsza początkową 30-punktową lukę dokładności między ustawieniami zerowymi a pełnymi danymi o dwie trzecie.', 'ro': 'Capacitatea de a analiza cuvintele schimbate de cod (CS), cum ar fi spaniolă + engleză sau hindi + engleză, este esențială pentru democratizarea sistemelor de analizare semantică orientate spre sarcini pentru anumite locații. În această lucrare, ne concentrăm pe spaniolă (spaniolă + engleză) și lansăm un set de date, CSTOP, care conține 5800 de pronunțări CS alături de analizele lor semantice. Examinăm generalizarea CS a diferitelor modele Cross-lingual (XL) și prezentăm avantajul modelelor de limbi XL pre-instruite atunci când datele pentru o singură limbă sunt prezente. Ca atare, ne concentrăm pe îmbunătățirea modelelor pre-instruite pentru caz atunci când sunt disponibile doar corpuri în limba engleză alături de zero sau câteva instanțe de formare CS. Propunem două metode de mărire a datelor pentru setările zero-shot și cele puține-shot: reglarea fină folosind translate-and-align și augment folosind un model de generație urmat de match-and-filter. Combinând setarea cu puține fotografii cu îmbunătățirile de mai sus reduce decalajul inițial de precizie de 30 de puncte dintre setările cu împușcături zero și setările cu date complete cu două treimi.', 'sr': 'U mogućnosti analiziranja reči koje su zamijenjene kod (CS), poput španjolske+engleske ili hindske+engleske, važno je za demokratizaciju semantičkih analiziranja sustava na određenim lokalnim mjestima. U ovom poslu, fokusiramo se na španjolski (španjolski+engleski) i oslobodimo set podataka, CSTOP, koja sadrži 5800 CS reči pored njihovih semantičkih analiza. Pregledavamo generalizabilnost CS-a različitih krstojezičkih modela (XL) i pokazujemo prednost predobučenih XL jezičkih modela kada su podaci za samo jedan jezik prisutni. Kao takvo, fokusiramo se na poboljšanje predobučenih modela za slučaj kada su dostupni samo engleski korpus pored nule ili nekoliko slučajeva za obuku. Predlažemo dve metode povećanja podataka za snimanje nule i podešavanje nekoliko snimaka: fin tune koristeći prevod i poravnanje i povećanje koristeći model generacije koji je praćen širenjem i filtrom. Kombiniranje nekoliko snimaka sa naprednim poboljšanjima smanjuje prazninu tačnosti od 30 bodova između nulog snimanja i punog podataka za dve trećine.', 'si': 'ස්පැනිස්+ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ හින්දි+ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වලින් කෝඩ් වෙනස් කළ (CS) වචනය විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න, ස්පැනිස් වලි මේ වැඩේ අපි ස්පැන්ලිෂ් (ස්පැන්ලිෂ්+ඉංග්\u200dරිෂ්) වලට ප්\u200dරධානය කරනවා ඒ වගේම දත්ත සැටියක්, CSTOP, 5800 CS කියන්නේ ඔවුන් අපි CS සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාවික (XL) මොඩේලන්ගේ සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන එක භාෂාවික විතරයි ත ඒ වගේම, අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි කොර්පුස් එක්ක සුන්ධ වෙන්නේ නැත්නම් CS ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණාවක් කිහිපයක් පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන අපි තොරතුරු විශාලනය සහ විශාලනය සඳහා තොරතුරු විශාලනය දෙකක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් උඩින් වැඩි වැඩි සැකසුම් කිහිපයක් සමග සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ප්\u200dරමාණය 30-පින්තුවක් සුන්ධ වෙඩි තියෙන්නේ සුන්ධ වෙඩි තියෙ', 'so': 'Isbanish (CS) waxaa muhiim ah in lagu demokraado nidaamka baaritaanka ah ee goobaha qaarkood. Shuqulkaas waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa Isbanish (Isbanish+Ingiriis) waxaana soo dirnaa koox macluumaad ah CSTOP, kaas oo ku yaala luqadaha CS iyo baaritaankooda semantika ah. Waxaynu baaritaan muuqashada samooyinka luuqadaha kala duduwan ee CS (XL) iyo tusaalaha afka hore ee XL marka macluumaadku ay jiraan hal luuqad oo kaliya. Sida darteed, waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa horumarinta modelalka horay loo tababaray, marka lagu helo halka ingiriisiga oo kaliya marka laga helo xaaladaha waxbarashada ee CS oo kaliya. Fin-tune using translate-and-align and augment using a generation model followed by match-and-filter. Isku socoshada dabeecada yar oo hagaajiga sare ayaa hoos u dhigi kara goobta saxda ah ee ugu horraysay 30 barxad oo saxda ah oo u dhexaysa nuurka iyo hagaajiyada macluumaadka oo dhan laba saddex meelood.', 'sv': 'Att kunna tolka kodväxlade (CS) uttryck, som spanska + engelska eller hindi + engelska, är viktigt för att demokratisera uppgiftsorienterade semantiska parsningssystem för vissa platser. I detta arbete fokuserar vi på spangliska (spanska+engelska) och släpper ett dataset, CSTOP, som innehåller 5800 CS-uttryck tillsammans med deras semantiska tolkningar. Vi undersöker CS generaliseringen av olika Cross-lingual (XL) modeller och uppvisar fördelen med pre-trained XL språkmodeller när data för endast ett språk finns. Som sådan fokuserar vi på att förbättra de förberedda modellerna för fallet när endast engelska korpus tillsammans med antingen noll eller några få CS-utbildningsinstanser finns tillgängliga. Vi föreslår två dataförstärkningsmetoder för noll-skott och få-skott inställningar: finjustera med translate-and-align och augment med en generationsmodell följt av match-and-filter. Genom att kombinera inställningen för få skott med ovanstående förbättringar minskar den inledande 30-punkts noggrannhetsklyftan mellan nollskott och full data-inställningar med två tredjedelar.', 'ta': 'Being able to parse code-switched (CS) utterances, such as Spanish+English or Hindi+English, is essential to democratize task-oriented semantic parsing systems for certain locales.  இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஸ்பாங்கிலிஷ்( ஸ்பானிஷ்+ஆங்கிலம்) மீது கவனம் செலுத்தி ஒரு தகவல் அமைப்பு, CSTOP, 5800 CS வார்த்தைகள் கொண்டு தங்கள் பா நாம் சிஎஸ் மொழிகளின் பொதுவானத்தை பரிசோதிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் ஒரே மொழிக்கு மட்டும் தகவல் இருக்கும் போது முன்பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட XL மொழி ம இப்படித்தான், நாம் முன் பயிற்சி முறைமையை மேம்படுத்தும் போது கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம் இந்த விஷயத்திற்கு மட்டும் ஆங்கிலத்தில் மட பூஜ்ஜியத்திற்கான இரண்டு தரவு கூட்டுதல் முறைகளை நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் மற்றும் சில சுட்டி அமைப்புகள்: பொருத்தம் மற்றும் வடிகட்டி பின்னர் பொ மேலே முன்னேற்றத்துடன் சில சுட்டு அமைப்புகளை ஒப்பிடுவதால் முதல் 30 புள்ளியின் சரியான இடைவெளியை குறைக்கும் மற்றும் முழு தகவல்', 'ur': 'کوڈ-سوچیڈ (CS) کلمات (اسپانیایی+انگلیسی+انگلیسی) کو پارس کرنے کے لئے قادر ہے، جیسے اسپانیایی+انگلیسی یا ہینڈی+انگلیسی، ایک مقررہ موقعیت کے لئے کام-oriented semantic parsing systems کو دموکراتی کرنے کے لئے ضر اس کام میں ہم اسپانګلیس (اسپانیایی+انگلیسی) پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں اور ایک ڈیٹسٹ، CSTOP کو آزاد کرتے ہیں، جس میں 5800 CS کلمات ہیں ان کے سیمنٹی پارس کے ساتھ۔ ہم CS کی مختلف کرس-زبان (XL) موڈلوں کی عمومی قابلیت کی تحقیق کر رہے ہیں اور پہلے تحصیل کی XL زبان موڈلوں کی فائدہ دکھاتے ہیں جب صرف ایک زبان کے لئے ڈاٹے موجود ہیں۔ اس طرح، ہم اس کیس کے لئے پیش آموزش کی موڈلیوں کو بہترین کرنے پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں جب صرف انگلیسی کورپوس صفر کے ساتھ یا چند سی ٹرینگ ٹرینگ موجودات موجود ہیں. ہم صفر-شٹ اور کم-شٹ سٹینٹ کے لئے دو ڈیٹا اگنٹمنٹ طریقے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں: translate-and-align اور اگنٹمنٹ کے مطابق ایک نسل موڈل کے مطابق مطابق مطابق اور-filter کے مطابق fine-tune. اوپر سے کم شٹ کے سامنے موجود ہونے کے ساتھ شروع کی سی پوینٹ کے دقیق فاصلہ کو صفر-شٹ اور پورے-ڈیٹ کے سامنے دو تین سے کم کرتا ہے.', 'mt': 'Being able to parse code-switched (CS) utterances, such as Spanish+English or Hindi+English, is essential to democratize task-oriented semantic parsing systems for certain locales.  F’din il-ħidma, niffokaw fuq Spanjol (Spanjol+Ingliż) u nirrilaxxaw sett ta’ dejta, CSTOP, li fih 5800 dikjarazzjoni CS flimkien mal-analiżijiet semantiċi tagħhom. We examine the CS generalizability of various Cross-lingual (XL) models and exhibit the advantage of pre-trained XL language models when data for only one language is present.  Bħala tali, niffokaw fuq it-titjib tal-mudelli mħarrġa minn qabel għall-każ meta corpus Ingliż biss flimkien ma’ żero jew ftit każijiet ta’ taħriġ tas-CS ikunu disponibbli. We propose two data augmentation methods for the zero-shot and the few-shot settings: fine-tune using translate-and-align and augment using a generation model followed by match-and-filter.  Combining the few-shot setting with the above improvements decreases the initial 30-point accuracy gap between the zero-shot and the full-data settings by two thirds.', 'uz': "Name Bu ishda, biz Ispanchaga (Ispancha+Inglizcha) foydalanamiz va CSTOP taʼrif etishda 5800 CS gaplari bilan semantik parchalar bilan boshlanadi. Biz har xil tilning (XL) modellarining CS (CS) generalizligini tekshirimiz va faqat bir tillar uchun maʼlumot mavjud boʻlsa, bir tilning bir tili uchun oldin XL tilning modellarini ko'rinamiz. Shunday qilib, biz birinchi taʼminlovchi modellarni o'rganish uchun foydalanamiz, faqat ingliz kompyuter bilan nuqta yoki bir necha CS trening imkoniyatlari mavjud boʻlsa. @ info: whatsthis Yuqori taʼminlovchilar bilan kamaytirilgan kichik sahifa moslamalari, nuqta bilan 30 nuqta aniqlash imkoniyatini kamaytirish va butun maʼlumot moslamalarini ikki uchinchi tomonidan kamaytirish.", 'vi': 'Có thể phân tích những từ đã bị ngắt mật mã (CS) như Tây Ban Nha, Anh hay Ấn Độ+Anh, là điều cần thiết để dân chủ hóa hệ thống phân tích theo ngữ pháp đặc biệt. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi tập trung vào Spanky (Tây Ban Nha+Anh) và công bố một bộ dữ liệu, CSTOP, gồm 5400 CS với những câu nói theo ngữ pháp của họ. Chúng tôi kiểm tra tính tổng thống CS của các mô hình chữ thập (XL) khác nhau và thể hiện lợi thế của những mô hình ngôn ngữ XL được đào tạo sẵn khi có dữ liệu chỉ cho một ngôn ngữ duy nhất. Do đó, chúng tôi tập trung vào cải thiện các mô hình được huấn luyện sẵn cho trường hợp khi chỉ có cơ thể Anh cùng với không số hoặc một số trường hợp CS có sẵn. Chúng tôi đề xuất hai phương pháp gia tăng dữ liệu cho trường quay không và các thiết lập ít ảnh: Tinh chỉnh bằng cách phiên dịch và chỉnh và tăng trưởng bằng một mô hình thế hệ sau đó là khớp và bộ lọc. Kết hợp thiết lập ít bắn với các cải tiến trên này sẽ giảm khoảng trống 9điểm chính xác đầu tiên giữa bắn không và thiết lập toàn bộ dữ liệu bằng hai phần ba.', 'da': 'At kunne fortolke kodekonverte (CS) udtalelser, såsom spansk + engelsk eller hindi + engelsk, er afgørende for at demokratisere opgaveorienterede semantiske fortolkningssystemer for visse lokaliteter. I dette arbejde fokuserer vi på spanglisk (spansk+engelsk) og udgiver et datasæt, CSTOP, der indeholder 5800 CS-udtalelser sammen med deres semantiske fortolkninger. Vi undersøger CS generaliseringen af forskellige cross-lingual (XL) modeller og udviser fordelen ved prætrænede XL sprogmodeller, når data for kun ét sprog er til stede. Som sådan fokuserer vi på at forbedre de prætrænede modeller til sagen, når kun engelsk korpus sammen med enten nul eller få CS-træningsinstanser er tilgængelige. Vi foreslår to dataforstørrelsesmetoder for nul-skud og få-skud indstillinger: finjustere ved hjælp af translate-and-align og augment ved hjælp af en generationsmodel efterfulgt af match-and-filter. Ved at kombinere indstillingen for få skud med ovenstående forbedringer reduceres den første 30-punkts nøjagtighed mellem nulskud og fuld data-indstillinger med to tredjedele.', 'hr': 'Biti u mogućnosti analizirati riječi koje su promijenili kod (CS), poput španjolskog+engleskog ili hindskog+engleskog, ključno je za demokratizaciju sustava semantičkog analiziranja na zadatke za određene lokale. U ovom poslu, usredotočili smo se na španjolski (španjolski+engleski) i oslobodili komplet podataka, CSTOP, sadržeći 5800 CS izraze pored njihovih semantičkih analiza. Provjeravamo generalizabilnost CS-a različitih krstojezičkih modela (XL) i pokazujemo prednost predobučenih XL jezičkih modela kada su podaci za samo jedan jezik prisutni. Kao što je tako, usredotočili smo se na poboljšanje predobučenih modela za slučaj kada su dostupni samo engleski korpus pored nule ili nekoliko CS treninga. Predlažemo dvije metode povećanja podataka za snimanje nule i postavke za nekoliko snimanja: fin-tune koristeći prevod-i-align i povećanje koristeći model generacije slijedeći širenjem i filtrom. U kombinaciji nastave za nekoliko snimanja s naprednim poboljšanjima smanjuje početni razmak točnosti od 30 bodova između nulog snimanja i punog podataka za dvije trećine.', 'nl': 'Het kunnen parsen van code-switched (CS) uitingen, zoals Spaans+Engels of Hindi+Engels, is essentieel om taakgerichte semantische parsing systemen voor bepaalde locales te democratiseren. In dit werk richten we ons op Spanglish (Spaans+Engels) en brengen we een dataset, CSTOP, uit, die 5800 CS-uitingen bevat naast hun semantische parsen. We onderzoeken de CS generaliseerbaarheid van verschillende Cross-lingual (XL) modellen en tonen het voordeel van voorgetrainde XL taalmodellen wanneer gegevens voor slechts één taal aanwezig zijn. Daarom richten we ons op het verbeteren van de voorgetrainde modellen voor het geval dat alleen Engels corpus naast nul of enkele CS trainingsinstanties beschikbaar zijn. We stellen twee methoden voor gegevensvergroting voor de zero-shot en de few-shot instellingen voor: fine-tune met translate-and-align en augment met behulp van een generatiemodel gevolgd door match-and-filter. Het combineren van de paar-shot instelling met de bovenstaande verbeteringen vermindert de initiële 30-punts nauwkeurigheidskloof tussen de nul-shot en de volledige-data instellingen met twee derde.', 'bg': 'Възможността да се анализират кодово превключени изказвания, като испански + английски или хинди + английски, е от съществено значение за демократизирането на ориентираните към задачите семантични анализиращи системи за определени локали. В тази работа се фокусираме върху испански (испански + английски) и публикуваме набор от данни, съдържащ 5800 изказвания заедно със семантичните им анализи. Изследваме обобщаваемостта на различните междуезични модели и показваме предимството на предварително обучените езикови модели, когато има данни само за един език. Като такъв, ние се фокусираме върху подобряването на предварително обучените модели за случая, когато само английски корпус заедно с нула или няколко инстанции за обучение по ЦК са налични. Предлагаме два метода за увеличаване на данните за настройките за нулев изстрел и няколко изстрела: фина настройка с помощта на превод и подравняване и увеличаване с помощта на генерационен модел, последван от съвпадение и филтриране. Комбинирането на настройката за няколко изстрела с горепосочените подобрения намалява първоначалната разлика от 30 точки в точността между настройките за нулев изстрел и пълни данни с две трети.', 'de': 'Um aufgabenorientierte semantische Parsing-Systeme für bestimmte Gebietsschemata zu demokratisieren, ist es unerlässlich, Code-Switched (CS)-Äußerungen wie Spanisch+Englisch oder Hindi+Englisch zu parsen. In dieser Arbeit konzentrieren wir uns auf Spanglish (Spanisch+Englisch) und veröffentlichen einen Datensatz, CSTOP, der 5800 CS Äußerungen neben ihren semantischen Parsen enthält. Wir untersuchen die CS Generalisierbarkeit verschiedener Cross-Lingual (XL) Modelle und zeigen den Vorteil von vortrainierten XL Sprachmodellen auf, wenn Daten für nur eine Sprache vorliegen. Daher konzentrieren wir uns darauf, die vortrainierten Modelle für den Fall zu verbessern, wenn nur englischer Korpus neben Null oder einigen CS-Trainingsinstanzen verfügbar ist. Wir schlagen zwei Methoden zur Datenaugmentation für die Null-Schuss- und die Wenige-Schuss-Einstellung vor: Feinabstimmung mittels Translate-and-Align und Augment mithilfe eines Generierungsmodells gefolgt von Match-and-Filter. Die Kombination der wenigen Aufnahmen mit den oben genannten Verbesserungen verringert den anfänglichen 30-Punkt-Genauigkeitsunterschied zwischen Null- und Volldateneinstellungen um zwei Drittel.', 'sw': 'Kuwezekana kuanzisha maneno ya kubadilishwa kwa kodi (CS), kama vile Kihispania+Kiingereza au Kihindi+Kiingereza, ni muhimu ya demokrasia mfumo wa mabadiliko ya kimapenzi kwa ajili ya maeneo fulani. Katika kazi hii, tunajikita kwa Kihispania (Kihispania+Kiingereza) na kuachia seti ya data, CSTOP, yenye hotuba 5800 za CS pamoja na mabango yao ya sekunde. Tunatachunguza uwezekano wa CS wa mifano mbalimbali ya lugha ya Cross (XL) na kuonyesha faida ya mifano ya lugha zilizofunzwa kabla ya XL wakati data kwa lugha moja tu ipo. Kwa mfano, tunalenga kuboresha mifano ya mafunzo ya awali kwa kesi hiyo pale ambapo viungo vya Kiingereza pekee vinapokuwa sifuri au matukio machache ya mafunzo ya CS yanapatikana. Tunazipendekeza njia mbili za kuongezea takwimu hizo zisizo sawia na seti chache zilizopigwa risasi: fine-tune kwa kutumia tafsiri-and-alipandisha na kuongeza kwa kutumia mifano ya kizazi iliyofuatikana na mpiga-and-filter. Kuunganisha hatua chache zilizopigwa na maendeleo hayo hapo juu hupunguza kiwango cha sahihi cha kwanza cha pointi 30 kati ya risasi sifuri na mazingira ya taarifa kwa theluthi mbili.', 'id': 'Bisa menghurai ucapan-kode-switched (CS), seperti bahasa Spanyol+Inggris atau Hindi+Inggris, adalah penting untuk mendemokratisasi sistem penghuraian semantis orientasi tugas untuk beberapa lokal. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami fokus pada Spanglish (Spanyol+Inggris) dan melepaskan set data, CSTOP, yang mengandung 5800 ucapan CS bersama parses semantis mereka. Kami memeriksa generalisasi CS dari berbagai model Cross-lingual (XL) dan menunjukkan keuntungan dari model bahasa XL yang dilatih sebelumnya ketika data hanya untuk satu bahasa ada. Sebagai seperti itu, kita fokus pada meningkatkan model pra-terlatih untuk kasus ketika hanya corpus Inggris di samping atau nol atau beberapa kasus pelatihan CS tersedia. Kami mengusulkan dua metode peningkatan data untuk pengaturan zero-shot dan beberapa-shot: fine-tune menggunakan terjemahan-dan-align dan augment menggunakan model generasi diikuti oleh match-and-filter. Kombinasi seting beberapa tembakan dengan perbaikan di atas mengurangi jarak akurasi awal 30 poin antara seting 0 tembakan dan data lengkap dengan dua pertiga.', 'tr': "Ködler üýtgedilmiş (CS) sözlerini, espanyol+iňlisçe ýa-da Hindi+iňlisçe görkezilip bilmek üçin taýýarlanan semantik parslama sistemalary beýleki ýerler üçin demokratik etmek üçin wajypdyr. Bu işde biz Spanglisçe (Ispanýolça+Iňlisçe) bilen üns berip, 5800 CS sözlerini semantik analyzlarynyň ýanynda çykarýarys. Biz CS'i birnäçe Halk Dili (XL) nusgalarynyň döredilik barlygyny barýarys we diňe bir dil üçin maglumat berilýän wagtlaryň üstüni görkeýäris. Şonuň ýaly diňe iňlis korpusy nul ýa-da birnäçe CS bilim öňünde bilim taýýarlanan nusgalaryny bejermek üçin üns berýäris. Biz 0-atly we küçük-atly düzümlerniň üçin iki maglumat bejer methodony teklip edýäris: fine-tune using translate-and-align and augment using a generation model followed by match-and-filter. Yukarıdaki gelişmeler bilen küçük resim düzümlerini birleşdirmek başlangıç 30 punktyň titizliklerini 0-aty we doly maglumat düzümlerini 2 üçin azaltýar.", 'sq': 'Të jesh në gjendje të analizosh shprehjet e ndryshuara me kod (CS), të tilla si Spanjolli+Anglisht apo Hindi+Anglisht, është thelbësore për të demokratizuar sistemet e analizimit semantik të orientuar ndaj detyrave për disa lokalë. Në këtë punë, ne përqëndrohemi në spanglish (Spanjoll+Anglisht) dhe lëshojmë një set të dhënash, CSTOP, që përmban 5800 shprehje CS së bashku me analizat semantike të tyre. We examine the CS generalizability of various Cross-lingual (XL) models and exhibit the advantage of pre-trained XL language models when data for only one language is present.  As such, we focus on improving the pre-trained models for the case when only English corpus alongside either zero or a few CS training instances are available.  Ne propozojmë dy metoda shtimi të të dhënave për rregullimet zero-shot dhe pak-shot: fine-tune duke përdorur përkthimin-dhe-align dhe rritjen duke përdorur një model gjenerate pasuar nga matching-and-filter. Kombinimi i përcaktimit me disa shtëna me përmirësimet e larta zvogëlon dallimin fillestar të saktësisë prej 30 pikësh midis shtënës zero dhe përcaktimit të të dhënave të plota me dy të tretat.', 'af': "Om kode-geskuif (CS) uitspraak te ontlees, soos Spaanse+Engels of Hindi+Engels, is onbehoorlik om taak-orienteerde semantiese verwerking stelsels vir sekere lokale te demokrateer. In hierdie werk, ons fokus op Spanglish (Spaanse+Engels) en verlos 'n datastel, CSTOP, bevat 5800 CS uitdrukkings langs hulle semantiese verwerking. Ons ondersoek die CS generaliserbaardigheid van verskeie Kruis-tale (XL) modele en vertoon die voordeel van voorafgeleerde XL taal modele wanneer data vir slegs een taal is voorsien. Soos so, ons fokus op die vooraf-onderwyse modele vir die geval te verbeter wanneer slegs Engelske korpus by die nul of 'n paar CS-onderwyselings beskikbaar is. Ons voorstel twee data augmentasie metodes vir die nul-skoot en die paar-skoot instellings: fin-tune gebruik translate-and-align en augment gebruik 'n generasie model gevolg deur match-and-filter. Kombineer die paar-skoot instelling met die bo verbeteringe verklein die aanvanklike 30-punt waarskynlikheid spasie tussen die nulskoot en die volle-data instellings deur twee derde.", 'hy': 'Կոդի փոխակերպված (CS) արտահայտությունները, ինչպիսիք են իսպաներենը+անգլերենը կամ հինդին+անգլերենը, կարևոր է որոշ տեղական բնակչությունների համար դեմոկրատացնելու համար: In this work, we focus on Spanglish (Spanish+English) and release a dataset, CSTOP, containing 5800 CS utterances alongside their semantic parses.  Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք տարբեր միջլեզվային (XL) մոդելների ընդհանուր հասարակությունը և ցույց ենք տալիս նախապատրաստված XL լեզվային մոդելների առավելությունը, երբ միայն մեկ լեզվի տվյալները գոյություն ունեն: Այսպիսով, մենք կենտրոնանում ենք նախապատրաստված մոդելների բարելավման վրա այն դեպքում, երբ միայն անգլերեն կորպուսը զրոյի կամ որոշ CS-ի ուսումնասիրության դեպքերի հետ կապված է: Մենք առաջարկում ենք երկու մեթոդ տվյալների աճի համար զրո-նկարի և մի քանի նկարների սահմանափակումների համար. լավ կազմել օգտագործելով թարգմանել-և-հարմարեցնել և աճել օգտագործելով սերնդի մոդել, որը հետևում է հարմար-և-ֆիլտր Առաջին բարելավումների հետ միավորելը նվազեցնում է սկզբնական 30-կետի ճշգրտության տարբերությունը զրոյի և ամբողջ տվյալների միջև երկու երրորդով:', 'az': 'İspanyol+İngilizce və Hindi+İngilizce kimi kodlanmış (CS) sözləri analizə bilmək, bəzi yerlərə göndərilmiş semantik analizə sistemlərini demokratik etmək üçün mövcuddur. Bu işdə İspanyolca (İspanyolca+İngilizca) ilə birlikdə 5800 CS sözləri barəsində verilən verilən quruluş CSTOP yayındırırıq. Biz CS müxtəlif XL modellerinin genelləşdirilməsini təhsil edirik və təhsil edilmiş XL dil modellerinin faydasını göstəririk ki, yalnız bir dil üçün verilər varsa. Bütün bunlar kimi, biz ancaq Nullu ya da bir neçə CS təhsil məsələlərinin yanında İngiliz korpusu üçün öyrənmiş modellərin yaxşılaşdırmasına odaklanırıq. Sıfır-vuruş və bir neçə-vuruş ayarları üçün iki veri artırma metodlarını təklif edirik: translate-and-align və artırma işlədirək bir nəsil modeli ilə eşitmək-və-filtr ilə istifadə edir. Yuxarıdaki yaxşılıqlarla birləşdirilmək sıfır vuruşu ilə dolu məlumat ayarları arasında ilk 30 nöqtələrin doğruluğunu 2 üçdə azaldır.', 'am': 'የኮድ-ቀለወጥ (CS) ቃላትን እንደ ስፓኒሽ+እንግሊዘኛ ወይም ኬንዲ+እንግሊዘኛ መግለጫ ማግኘት ግለጫ ማግኘት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ የስፓኒሽ (ስፓኒሽ+እንግሊዘኛ) እናስማምናለን የጽሑፍ ፋይሎች 5800 CS ቃላትን እናስገድዳለን፡፡ የCS የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ (XL) ሞዴላዎችን መፍጠር እናደርጋለን እና ለአንድ ቋንቋ ብቻ ዳታ ሲገኝበት በፊት የተማረከ የXL ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎችን ጥቅም እናደርጋለን፡፡ እንደዚህ፣ የፊተኛውን ተማሪ ሞዴል ማድረግ እናስማታለን፤ በንግልዝኛ ኮፕስስ ብቻ በ0 ወይም ጥቂት የCS ትምህርት ግንኙነት ቢገኙ ነው፡፡ fine-tune using translation-and-align and augment using a generation model followed by match-and-filter. በቁጥር እና በሙሉ የዳታ ምርጫዎች በሁለት ሦስት ጥያቄዎች መካከል የመጀመሪያውን 30 ነጥብ እርግጠኛ ክፍል ያሳድጋል፡፡', 'ko': '스페인어 + 영어 또는 인디언 + 영어 같은 코드 변환 (CS) 문장을 해석할 수 있는 것은 일부 지역에서 임무를 위한 의미 해석 시스템의 민주화에 매우 중요하다.이 작업에서 우리는 스페인식 영어(스페인어+영어)를 주목하고 5800개의 CS 언어와 그 의미 해석을 포함하는 데이터 집합 CSTOP을 발표했다.우리는 각종 크로스 언어(XL) 모델의 CS 통용성을 연구했고 한 언어의 데이터만 존재할 때 미리 훈련된 XL 언어 모델의 장점을 보여 주었다.따라서 영어 자료 라이브러리와 0 개 또는 몇 개의 CS 훈련 실례만 사용할 수 있을 때 우리는 예비 훈련 모델을 중점적으로 개선할 것이다.우리는 제로 렌즈와 소수 렌즈 설정에 사용되는 두 가지 데이터 강화 방법을 제시했다. 평이와 정렬을 사용하여 마이크로스피커를 하고 생성 모델을 사용하여 강화한 다음에 일치와 필터를 사용한다.소량의 방포 설정을 상술한 개선과 결합하면 제로 방포와 전체 데이터 설정 간의 초기 30점 정밀도 차이를 3분의 2로 줄일 수 있다.', 'fa': 'قادر بودن کلمات تغییر کد (CS) را، مثل اسپانیایی+انگلیسی یا هندی+انگلیسی، برای دموکراتیزی سیستم تجزیه\u200cهای semantic oriented task-oriented semantic for certain locales، تحلیل کردن ضروری است. در این کار، ما روی اسپانیایی (اسپانیایی+انگلیسی) تمرکز می\u200cکنیم و یک مجموعه داده\u200cای، CSTOP را آزاد می\u200cکنیم، که با 5800 کلمات CS در کنار تحلیل\u200cهای semantic آنها است. ما قابلیت CS عمومی از مدل\u200cهای متفاوت زبان (XL) را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم و منافع مدل\u200cهای زبان XL پیش آموزش داده می\u200cشویم وقتی داده\u200cهای تنها یک زبان وجود دارد. به عنوان این، ما روی improving pre-trained models for the case focused on improving the case when only English corpus alongside either zero or a few CS training instances are available. ما دو روش افزایش داده برای صفر و تنظیمات چند شلیک پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم: با استفاده از ترجمه و تنظیمات و افزایش با استفاده از یک مدل نسل و پیروی از پالایٹ match-and-filter. تعداد تنظیمات چند شلیک با توسعه\u200cهای بالا، فاصله دقیق ۳۰ نقطه آغاز بین شلیک صفر و تنظیمات اطلاعات کامل به دو سوم کاهش می\u200cدهد.', 'cs': 'Umět analyzovat výroky přepínané kódem (CS), jako jsou španělština+angličtina nebo hindština+angličtina, je nezbytné pro demokratizaci systémů sémantického parsování pro určitá místa. V této práci se zaměřujeme na spanglištinu (španělština+angličtina) a vydáváme datovou sadu CSTOP obsahující 5800 CS výroky vedle jejich sémantických pars. Zkoumáme zobecňovatelnost CS různých cross-lingual (XL) modelů a ukazujeme výhodu předškolených XL jazykových modelů, pokud jsou přítomna data pouze pro jeden jazyk. Proto se zaměřujeme na zlepšení předškolených modelů pro případ, kdy je k dispozici pouze anglický korpus vedle nuly nebo několika CS školicích instancí. Navrhujeme dvě metody rozšíření dat pro nastavení nulového a několika záběrů: jemné ladění pomocí přeložení a zarovnání a rozšíření pomocí generačního modelu následovaného shodou a filtrem. Kombinace nastavení několika snímků s výše uvedenými vylepšeními snižuje počáteční 30bodovou mezeru přesnosti mezi nastavením nulového a plného snímku o dvě třetiny.', 'et': 'Koodi vahetatud (CS) väljendite parsimine, nagu hispaania + inglise või hindi + inglise keel, on oluline ülesannetele orienteeritud semantilise parsimise süsteemide demokratiseerimiseks teatud lokaadides. Käesolevas töös keskendume hispaania keelele (hispaania + inglise keel) ja avaldame andmekogumi CSTOP, mis sisaldab 5800 CS-lauset koos semantilise parsimisega. Uurime erinevate keeleüleste (XL) mudelite CS üldistatavust ja näitame eelnevalt koolitatud XL keelemudelite eeliseid, kui andmed on olemas ainult ühe keele kohta. Seetõttu keskendume eelnevalt koolitatud mudelite täiustamisele juhul, kui saadaval on ainult inglise keele korpus koos nulli või mõne CS koolituse korraga. Pakume välja kaks andmete suurendamise meetodit null-shot ja mõne-shot seadete jaoks: peenhäälestamine tõlkimise ja joondamise abil ning suurendamine generatsiooni mudeli abil, millele järgneb match-and-filter. Ühendades mõne pildi seadistuse ülaltoodud täiustustega vähendab algset 30-punktilist täpsusevahet null-pildi ja täisandmete seadete vahel kahe kolmandiku võrra.', 'fi': 'Osaaminen jﾃ､sentﾃ､ﾃ､ koodilla vaihtuvia lauseita, kuten espanja+englanti tai hindi+englanti, on vﾃ､lttﾃ､mﾃ､tﾃｶntﾃ､ demokratisoida tehtﾃ､vﾃ､lﾃ､htﾃｶisiﾃ､ semanttisia jﾃ､sennysjﾃ､rjestelmiﾃ､ tietyille alueille. Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ tyﾃｶssﾃ､ keskitymme espanjankieliseen (espanja+englanti) ja julkaisemme CSTOP-aineiston, joka sisﾃ､ltﾃ､ﾃ､ 5800 CS-lausetta semanttisten jﾃ､sennysten ohella. Tutkimme eri monikielisten (XL) mallien CS-yleistettﾃ､vyyttﾃ､ ja osoitamme esikoulutettujen XL-kielimallien etua, kun tietoja on vain yhdestﾃ､ kielestﾃ､. Nﾃ､in ollen keskitymme esikoulutettujen mallien parantamiseen tapaukseen, kun kﾃ､ytettﾃ､vissﾃ､ on vain englanninkielinen korpus joko nollan tai muutaman CS-koulutuksen ohella. Ehdotamme kahta datan lisﾃ､ysmenetelmﾃ､ﾃ､ nolla- ja muutaman kuvan asetuksille: hienosﾃ､ﾃ､tﾃｶﾃ､ kﾃ､ﾃ､nnﾃｶs- ja tasausmenetelmﾃ､llﾃ､ ja lisﾃ､ystﾃ､ generaatiomallilla, jota seuraa match-and-filter. Muutaman kuvan asetuksen yhdistﾃ､minen edellﾃ､ mainittuihin parannuksiin vﾃ､hentﾃ､ﾃ､ nollakuvan ja tﾃ､yden datan asetusten vﾃ､listﾃ､ 30 pisteen tarkkuuseroa kahdella kolmasosalla.', 'bn': 'স্প্যানিশ+ইংরেজি অথবা হিন্দি+ইংরেজীর মত কোড-পরিবর্তন (সিসি) ভাষাগুলোকে পার্স করতে পারার ক্ষেত্রে কিছু স্থানীয় এলাকার জন্য গণতান্ত্রিক সে এই কাজে আমরা স্প্যাঙ্গেলিশ (স্প্যানিশ+ইংরেজী) নিয়ে মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি এবং সেম্পেন্টিক পার্সের সাথে একটি ডাটাসেট সিস্টোপির মুক্তি  আমরা বিভিন্ন ক্রস-ভাষার (এক্সএল) মডেলের সাধারণ সংস্করণ পরীক্ষা করি এবং প্রশিক্ষিত এক্সএল ভাষার মডেলের সুবিধা প্রদর্শন করি যখন শুধুমাত্র একটি ভাষ যেমন, আমরা এই কেসের পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত মডেল উন্নয়নের দিকে মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি যখন শুধুমাত্র ইংরেজি কোর্পাসের সাথে শুধুমাত্র শূন্য অথবা কি আমরা শুধুমাত্র শুট এবং কয়েকটি গুলি বৈশিষ্ট্যের জন্য দুটি তথ্য যোগাযোগ মাধ্যম প্রস্তাব করি: অনুবাদ- এবং- এলাইমেন্ট ব্যবহার করে ভাল- টুন এবং যোগ করে একট উপরের উন্নতির সাথে যে কয়েকটি গুলি সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত প্রাথমিক ৩০ বিন্দুর সঠি', 'bs': 'Biti u mogućnosti analizirati izraze koji su promijenili kode (CS), poput španjolske+engleske ili hindijske+engleske, važno je za demokratizaciju sistema semantičkog analiziranja na zadatke za određene lokale. U ovom poslu, fokusiramo se na španjolski (španjolski+engleski) i oslobodimo komplet podataka, CSTOP, koji sadrži 5800 CS izraze pored njihovih semantičkih analiza. Provjeravamo generalizabilnost CS-a različitih krstojezičkih modela (XL) i pokazujemo prednost predobučenih XL jezičkih modela kada su podaci za samo jedan jezik prisutni. Kao što je tako, fokusiramo se na poboljšanje predobučenih modela za slučaj kada su dostupni samo engleski korpus pored nule ili nekoliko CS treninga. Predlažemo dvije metode povećanja podataka za snimanje nule i podešavanje nekoliko snimaka: fin-tune koristeći prevod-i-align i povećanje koristeći model generacije slijedeći širenjem i filtrom. Spojivanje nastave za nekoliko snimanja sa iznad poboljšanja smanjuje početnu tačnost od 30 bodova između nulog snimanja i punog podataka za dvije trećine.', 'ca': "Being able to parse code-switched (CS) utterances, such as Spanish+English or Hindi+English, is essential to democratize task-oriented semantic parsing systems for certain locales.  In this work, we focus on Spanglish (Spanish+English) and release a dataset, CSTOP, containing 5800 CS utterances alongside their semantic parses.  Examinem la generalització CS de diversos models translingües (XL) i mostram l'avantatge de models de llenguatge XL pré-entrenats quan només hi ha dades per una llengua. As such, we focus on improving the pre-trained models for the case when only English corpus alongside either zero or a few CS training instances are available.  We propose two data augmentation methods for the zero-shot and the few-shot settings: fine-tune using translate-and-align and augment using a generation model followed by match-and-filter.  Combinant la configuració de poques fotografies amb les millores anteriors redueix la brecha inicial de precisió de 30 punts entre la fotografia zero i la configuració de dades completas en dos terços.", 'he': 'היכולת לפרסם מיטות משתנות קוד (CS), כמו ספרדית+אנגלית או הינדי+אנגלית, היא חיונית כדי לדמוקרטיזם מערכות בדיקת סמנטית ממוקדות למשימות מסוימות למקומות מסוימים. בעבודה הזו, אנחנו מתמקדים בספרדית (ספרדית+אנגלית) ולשחרר קבוצת נתונים, CSTOP, שמכילה 5800 מבטות CS לצד הפרסים הסמנטיים שלהם. אנו בודקים את הגנרליזציות CS של דוגמנים צליביים (XL) שונים ולהראות את יתרון של דוגמנים לשפה XL מאומנים מראש כאשר נתונים לשפה אחת בלבד נוכחים. ככה, אנחנו מתמקדים בשיפור של הדוגמנים המאמנים מראש למקרה כאשר רק קורפוס אנגלי לצד אפס או כמה מקרים אימונים CS זמינים. We propose two data augmentation methods for the zero-shot and the few-shot settings: fine-tune using translate-and-align and augment using a generation model followed by match-and-filter.  שילוב את הגדרות של הצילומים הקטנים עם השיפורים העליונים מפחיד את הפער הראשון של מדויקת 30 נקודות בין הצילומים האפסיים לבין הגדרות של הנתונים המלאים ב-2/3.', 'jv': 'Jejaring Nang barêng-barêng iki, kita dipoles Spanish (Spanish +) lan unyekno dataset, CSTOP, supoyo 5800 CS akeh barang semantasi sing nyebutaké semantasi. Awak dhéwé éntuk pernik CS Generalization kanggo model yang sampeyan Kros-Lingagal (XL) lan nganggep nggawe barang dhéwé kuwi model sing wis antarané XL luwih apik, iso nggambar data kanggo mbalké sampeyan. Yo wis dipoleh, kita dipoleh bantuan kanggo ngerasai model sing arep bantuan kanggo kowe mesthi, ingkang sampeyan ingkang dipoleh kuwi padha 0 atawa alih sing beraksi perusahaan CS. We proposal the data expanding method for the null-shot and the little-shot settings: Fine-tune Using translation-and-align and agement politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'sk': 'Zmožnost razčlenitve izgovorov s preklopom kode (CS), kot so španščina + angleščina ali hindujščina + angleščina, je bistvenega pomena za demokratiziranje sistemov semantičnega razčlenitve, usmerjenih v opravila, za določene lokacije. V tem delu se osredotočamo na španščino (španščina + angleščina) in objavljamo nabor podatkov CSTOP, ki vsebuje 5800 CS izjav poleg semantičnih razčlenitev. Preučujemo splošnost CS različnih medjezičnih (XL) modelov in pokažemo prednost predhodno usposobljenih XL jezikovnih modelov, kadar so prisotni podatki samo za en jezik. Zato se osredotočamo na izboljšanje vnaprej usposobljenih modelov za primer, ko je na voljo samo angleški korpus poleg nič ali nekaj primerov usposabljanja za področje informacije. Predlagamo dve metodi povečanja podatkov za nastavitve ničelnega in nekaj posnetkov: natančno nastavitev s prevajanjem in poravnavo ter povečanje z generacijskim modelom, ki mu sledi ujemanje in filtriranje. Združitev nastavitve nekaj posnetkov z zgoraj navedenimi izboljšavami zmanjša začetno vrzel natančnosti 30 točk med nastavitvami ničelnega posnetka in polnimi podatki za dve tretjini.', 'ha': "@ item Spelling dictionary Daga wannan aikin, munã fokus a kan spankiya (Isbanish+Ingiriya) kuma munã saka wani tsari na database, na ƙunsa da saurãren salo 580 Tuna jarraba mai General of the CR-s-language (XL) kuma Muke nuna amfani da misãlai na zaman-wa'anar XL idan data za'a ƙunsa da harshe guda kawai. Kamar wannan, Munã fokus zuwa wajen kyautata misalin wanda aka yi wa zaman shirin da shi a gaba ɗaya wa case idan ana iya sãmun nau'in Ingiriya kawai da shi, sifiri ko kuma kaɗan da aka sami tsarin wa zaman shawarar. Tuna goyyade shiryoyin ƙari biyu na data wa tsarin sifo-shot da few-shot: fin- tune used translate-and-aliyyade and august by wani motel na ƙari wanda ya bi-gyare-and-filter. Aka daidaita masu kaɗan da kewayi da improvements masu gaba, zai ƙara gaura na kwanan kwance na 30-point da aka ƙayyade tsakanin 0-shot da daidaita-data guda biyu na ukunsa.", 'bo': "Being able to parse code-switched (CS) utterances, such as Spanish+English or Hindi+English, is essential to democratize task-oriented semantic parsing systems for certain locales. In this work, we focus on Spanglish (Spanish+English) and release a dataset, CSTOP, containing 5800 CS utterances alongside their semantic parses. It's a funny idea. ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག དཔེར་ན། ང་ཚོས་དབུས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་གཅིག་ཀྱང་མཐོང་ཚུལ་ལས་སྔོན་གྲངས་བསྒྲིག་མིན་པ་ལྟར་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་། We propose two data augmentation methods for the zero-shot and the few-shot settings: fine-tune using translate-and-align and augment using a generation model followed by match-and-filter. Combining the few-shot settings with the above improvement."}
{'en': 'Generating Syntactically Controlled Paraphrases without Using Annotated Parallel Pairs', 'fr': 'Génération de paraphrases syntaxiquement contrôlées sans utiliser de paires parallèles annotées', 'es': 'Generación de paráfrasis controladas sintácticamente sin usar pares paralelos anotados', 'ar': 'توليد عبارات يتم التحكم فيها نحويًا دون استخدام أزواج متوازية مشروحة', 'pt': 'Gerando paráfrases sintaticamente controladas sem usar pares paralelos anotados', 'ja': 'アノテーションされたパラレルペアを使用せずに構文制御されたパラフレーズを生成する', 'hi': 'एनोटेट किए गए समानांतर जोड़े का उपयोग किए बिना वाक्यात्मक रूप से नियंत्रित पैराफ़्रेज़ उत्पन्न करना', 'zh': '生语法制释义,不用带注并行对', 'ru': 'Генерация синтаксически управляемых парафраз без использования аннотированных параллельных пар', 'ga': 'Athr처ga at찼 Rialaithe go Siontach a Ghini첬int gan P챕ir챠 Comhthreomhara An처t찼ilte a 횣s찼id', 'ka': 'სინტაქტიკურად კონტროლური პარაფრაზების შექმნა', 'el': 'Δημιουργία συντακτικά ελεγχόμενων παραφράσεων χωρίς χρήση σχολιασμένων παράλληλων ζευγαριών', 'hu': 'Szintaktikusan vezérelt parafrázisok generálása jegyzetelt párhuzamos párok használata nélkül', 'lt': 'Sintaktiškai kontroliuojamų parafrazių generavimas nenaudojant pažymėtų lygiagrečių porų', 'it': 'Generare parafrase controllate sintatticamente senza usare coppie parallele annotate', 'kk': 'Синтактикалық контроллеу параметрлерін жасау', 'mk': 'Генерирање синтактички контролирани парафрази без користење на анотирани паралелни парови', 'ml': 'സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായി നിയന്ത്രിക്കപ്പെട്ട പാരാഫ്രസുകള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു', 'ms': 'Menjana Parafrasa Dikawal Sintaktik tanpa menggunakan pasangan Paralel Ditanda', 'mt': 'Il-Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Parafrażijiet Kontrollati Sintetikament mingħajr l-Użu ta’ Pawġi Paraleli Annotati', 'mn': 'Синтактик Хэрэглэгдсэн Парафразуудыг ашиглахгүй', 'pl': 'Generowanie parafraz kontrolowanych syntaktycznie bez użycia adnotacji parafraz równoległych', 'no': 'Lagar syntaksisk kontrollerte parafrasar utan å bruka merke parallelle par', 'ro': 'Generarea parafrazelor controlate sintactic fără a utiliza perechi paralele adnotate', 'si': 'සංවිධානයෙන් පාරප්\u200dරතිකාරය පාරප්\u200dරතිකාරය නිර්මාණය කරන්න', 'sr': 'Generiranje sintaktički kontroliranih parafraza bez upotrebe Annotated Parallel Pairs', 'so': 'Generating Paraphrases oo aan isticmaalin baarlamaanka la soo bandhigay', 'sv': 'Generera syntaktiskt kontrollerade parafraser utan att använda kommenterade parallellpar', 'ta': 'ஒத்திசைவாக கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்ட பரப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தாமல் ஒத்திசைப்படுத்தப்படுகிறது', 'ur': 'سینٹاکیٹ کے ساتھ کنٹرولٹ پارافریزز ایجاد کی جاتی ہے بغیر آنٹیٹ کی پارالیل جوڑے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tạo ra các cụm từ dù điều khiển không gõ', 'bg': 'Генериране на синтактично контролирани парафрази без използване на анотирани паралелни двойки', 'da': 'Generering af syntaksisk kontrollerede parafraser uden brug af noterede parallelle par', 'nl': 'Syntactisch gecontroleerde parafrases genereren zonder geannoteerde parallelle paren te gebruiken', 'ko': '주석이 있는 평행으로 생성 문법 제어에 대한 해석을 사용하지 않는다', 'hr': 'Generiranje sintaktički kontroliranih parafraza bez primjene Annotated Parallel Pairs', 'fa': 'ایجاد پارافریز\u200cهای کنترل سنتاکتیکی بدون استفاده از جفت\u200cهای پاراللی مشخص شده', 'de': 'Generieren syntaktisch gesteuerter Paraphrasen ohne Verwendung von kommentierten parallelen Paaren', 'tr': 'Sintaktik Mümkin Senedmeler Dönüşdirilýar', 'sw': 'Kutengeneza Paraphras zinazodhibitiwa kwa ushirikiano bila kutumia Pair zilizotangazwa', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'sq': 'Duke krijuar parafraza të kontrolluara sintaktikisht pa përdorur dy paralele të anotuara', 'af': 'Genereer sintakteel Kontroleerde Parafrase sonder gebruik van aanmerkte Parallele Pairs', 'az': 'Sintaktik Kontroll…ônmiŇü Parafrazl…ôr ńįfad…ô edilm…ôd…ôn yaradńĪlńĪr', 'hy': 'Սինտակտիկ կառավարվող պարաֆրեզներ ստեղծելը առանց օգտագործելու նշումնավոր զույգեր', 'bn': 'প্যারাফ্রাস ব্যবহার করা ছাড়া সিন্ট্যাক্টিক্যালিকভাবে নিয়ন্ত্রণ করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Generiranje sintaktički kontroliranih parafraza bez upotrebe Annotated Parallel Pairs', 'ca': 'generar parafrases controlades sintàticament sense utilitzar parells paralèls anotats', 'et': 'Süntaktiliselt kontrollitud parafraaside genereerimine ilma annoteeritud paralleelsete paaride kasutamata', 'fi': 'Syntaktisesti ohjattujen parafraasien luominen ilman huomautuksia rinnakkaispareja', 'id': 'Membuat Parafrasa Dikontrol Sintaktik tanpa menggunakan Pasangan Paralel Annotasi', 'cs': 'Generování syntakticky řízených parafrází bez použití anotovaných paralelních párů', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje sintetično nadzorovanih vzporednih fraz brez uporabe označenih vzporednih parov', 'he': 'מייצר פראפרסמות ששולטות באופן סינטקטי בלי להשתמש בזוגים שונים', 'bo': 'སྔོན་སྤྱོད་བྱས་པའི་སྒྲ་སྐད་དབྱིབས་བཟོས་པའི་ཡིག་རྟགས་ཚིག་མ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པར་བཟོ་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ', 'jv': 'Jejaring'}
{'en': 'Paraphrase generation plays an essential role in natural language process (NLP), and it has many downstream applications. However, training supervised paraphrase models requires many annotated paraphrase pairs, which are usually costly to obtain. On the other hand, the paraphrases generated by existing unsupervised approaches are usually syntactically similar to the source sentences and are limited in diversity. In this paper, we demonstrate that it is possible to generate syntactically various paraphrases without the need for annotated paraphrase pairs. We propose Syntactically controlled Paraphrase Generator (SynPG), an encoder-decoder based model that learns to disentangle the semantics and the syntax of a sentence from a collection of unannotated texts. The disentanglement enables SynPG to control the syntax of output paraphrases by manipulating the embedding in the syntactic space. Extensive experiments using automatic metrics and human evaluation show that SynPG performs better syntactic control than unsupervised baselines, while the quality of the generated paraphrases is competitive. We also demonstrate that the performance of SynPG is competitive or even better than supervised models when the unannotated data is large. Finally, we show that the syntactically controlled paraphrases generated by SynPG can be utilized for data augmentation to improve the robustness of NLP models.', 'ar': 'يلعب إعادة الصياغة دورًا أساسيًا في عملية اللغة الطبيعية (NLP) ، وله العديد من التطبيقات النهائية. ومع ذلك ، تتطلب نماذج إعادة الصياغة الخاضعة للإشراف العديد من أزواج إعادة الصياغة المشروحة ، والتي عادة ما تكون مكلفة للحصول عليها. من ناحية أخرى ، فإن إعادة الصياغة الناتجة عن الأساليب الحالية غير الخاضعة للرقابة عادة ما تكون مشابهة نحويًا لجمل المصدر ومحدودة في التنوع. في هذه الورقة ، نوضح أنه من الممكن إنشاء العديد من إعادة الصياغة من الناحية التركيبية دون الحاجة إلى أزواج إعادة الصياغة المشروحة. نقترح Paraphrase Generator (SynPG) الخاضع للتحكم النحوي ، وهو نموذج قائم على وحدة فك التشفير والتشفير يتعلم فصل الدلالات وتركيب الجملة من مجموعة من النصوص غير المشروحة. يمكّن فك التشابك SynPG من التحكم في بناء جملة إعادة صياغة الإخراج عن طريق معالجة التضمين في الفضاء النحوي. تُظهر التجارب المكثفة باستخدام المقاييس التلقائية والتقييم البشري أن SynPG تؤدي تحكمًا نحويًا أفضل من خطوط الأساس غير الخاضعة للإشراف ، في حين أن جودة إعادة الصياغة التي تم إنشاؤها تنافسية. نوضح أيضًا أن أداء SynPG تنافسي أو حتى أفضل من النماذج الخاضعة للإشراف عندما تكون البيانات غير المقيدة كبيرة. أخيرًا ، نوضح أن إعادة الصياغة التي يتم التحكم فيها نحويًا والتي تم إنشاؤها بواسطة SynPG يمكن استخدامها لزيادة البيانات لتحسين متانة نماذج البرمجة اللغوية العصبية.', 'es': 'La generación de paráfrasis desempeña un papel esencial en el proceso del lenguaje natural (NLP) y tiene muchas aplicaciones posteriores. Sin embargo, el entrenamiento de modelos de paráfrasis supervisados requiere muchos pares de paráfrasis anotados, que generalmente son costosos de obtener. Por otro lado, las paráfrasis generadas por los enfoques no supervisados existentes suelen ser sintácticamente similares a las oraciones fuente y tienen una diversidad limitada. En este artículo, demostramos que es posible generar sintácticamente varias paráfrasis sin necesidad de pares de paráfrasis anotados. Proponemos Syntactically controlled Paraphrase Generator (SynPG), un modelo basado en codificador-decodificador que aprende a desenredar la semántica y la sintaxis de una oración de una colección de textos no anotados. El desenredado permite a SynPG controlar la sintaxis de las paráfrasis de salida manipulando la incrustación en el espacio sintáctico. Los extensos experimentos que utilizan métricas automáticas y evaluación humana muestran que SynPG realiza un mejor control sintáctico que las líneas de base no supervisadas, mientras que la calidad de las paráfrasis generadas es competitiva. También demostramos que el rendimiento de SynPG es competitivo o incluso mejor que el de los modelos supervisados cuando los datos no anotados son grandes. Finalmente, mostramos que las paráfrasis controladas sintácticamente generadas por SynPG se pueden utilizar para el aumento de datos para mejorar la robustez de los modelos de PNL.', 'fr': "La génération de paraphrases joue un rôle essentiel dans le processus de langage naturel (PNL), et elle a de nombreuses applications en aval. Cependant, la formation de modèles de paraphrase supervisée nécessite de nombreuses paires de paraphrases annotées, qui sont généralement coûteuses à obtenir. D'autre part, les paraphrases générées par les approches non supervisées existantes sont généralement syntaxiquement similaires aux phrases sources et leur diversité est limitée. Dans cet article, nous démontrons qu'il est possible de générer différentes paraphrases syntaxiquement sans avoir besoin de paires de paraphrases annotées. Nous proposons un générateur de paraphrase syntaxiquement contrôlé (SynPG), un modèle basé sur un encodeur-décodeur qui apprend à démêler la sémantique et la syntaxe d'une phrase d'une collection de textes non annotés. Le démêlage permet à SynPG de contrôler la syntaxe des paraphrases de sortie en manipulant l'intégration dans l'espace syntaxique. Des expériences approfondies utilisant des métriques automatiques et une évaluation humaine montrent que SynPG effectue un meilleur contrôle syntaxique que les lignes de base non supervisées, tandis que la qualité des paraphrases générées est compétitive. Nous démontrons également que les performances de SynPG sont compétitives, voire meilleures que celles des modèles supervisés lorsque les données non annotées sont volumineuses. Enfin, nous montrons que les paraphrases syntaxiquement contrôlées générées par SynPG peuvent être utilisées pour augmenter les données afin d'améliorer la robustesse des modèles de PNL.", 'pt': 'A geração de paráfrases desempenha um papel essencial no processo de linguagem natural (NLP), e tem muitas aplicações downstream. No entanto, o treinamento de modelos de paráfrases supervisionados requer muitos pares de paráfrases anotados, que geralmente são caros para obter. Por outro lado, as paráfrases geradas por abordagens não supervisionadas existentes geralmente são sintaticamente semelhantes às frases de origem e são limitadas em diversidade. Neste artigo, demonstramos que é possível gerar sintaticamente várias paráfrases sem a necessidade de pares de paráfrases anotados. Propomos o Gerador de Parafrases Sintaticamente Controlado (SynPG), um modelo baseado em codificador-decodificador que aprende a separar a semântica e a sintaxe de uma frase de uma coleção de textos não anotados. A separação permite que o SynPG controle a sintaxe das paráfrases de saída manipulando a incorporação no espaço sintático. Extensos experimentos usando métricas automáticas e avaliação humana mostram que o SynPG realiza melhor controle sintático do que linhas de base não supervisionadas, enquanto a qualidade das paráfrases geradas é competitiva. Também demonstramos que o desempenho do SynPG é competitivo ou até melhor do que os modelos supervisionados quando os dados não anotados são grandes. Finalmente, mostramos que as paráfrases sintaticamente controladas geradas pelo SynPG podem ser utilizadas para aumento de dados para melhorar a robustez dos modelos de PNL.', 'ru': 'Генерация перефразов играет важную роль в процессе естественного языка (NLP), и она имеет множество последующих приложений. Тем не менее, обучение под наблюдением парафразных моделей требует много аннотированных пар парафраз, которые, как правило, дорого получить. С другой стороны, парафразы, генерируемые существующими неконтролируемыми подходами, обычно синтаксически схожи с исходными предложениями и ограничены в разнообразии. В этой работе мы демонстрируем, что возможно создавать синтаксически различные парафразы без необходимости аннотированных пар парафраз. Мы предлагаем синтаксически управляемый генератор парафраз (SynPG), модель, основанную на кодировщике-декодере, которая учится распутать семантику и синтаксис предложения из коллекции неаннотированных текстов. Распутывание позволяет SynPG контролировать синтаксис выходных парафраз, манипулируя встраиванием в синтаксическое пространство. Широкие эксперименты с использованием автоматических метрик и оценки человека показывают, что SynPG выполняет лучший синтаксический контроль, чем неконтролируемые базовые линии, в то время как качество сгенерированных парафраз является конкурентоспособным. Мы также демонстрируем, что производительность SynPG конкурентоспособна или даже лучше, чем модели под наблюдением, когда аннотированные данные велики. Наконец, мы показываем, что синтаксически управляемые парафразы, генерируемые SynPG, могут быть использованы для увеличения данных для улучшения надежности моделей NLP.', 'ja': 'パラフレーズ生成は、自然言語プロセス（ ＮＬＰ ）において不可欠な役割を果たし、多くの下流アプリケーションを有する。 しかしながら、監督されたパラフレーズモデルのトレーニングには、多くの注釈付きパラフレーズペアが必要であり、これらは通常、入手するのに費用がかかります。 一方、既存の監督されていないアプローチによって生成されるパラフレーズは、通常、ソース文と構文的に類似しており、多様性に制限がある。 本稿では、注釈付きパラフレーズペアを必要とせずに、様々なパラフレーズを構文的に生成することが可能であることを実証する。 私たちは、未注釈のテキストのコレクションから文のセマンティクスと構文を切り離すことを学ぶエンコーダ-デコーダベースのモデルである、構文制御パラフレーズジェネレータ（ SynPG ）を提案します。 解離を使用すると、SynPGは構文空間への埋め込みを操作することで、出力パラフレーズの構文を制御できます。 自動測定基準およびヒト評価を用いた広範な実験は、SynPGが監督されていないベースラインよりも優れた構文制御を実行する一方で、生成されたパラフレーズの品質は競争力があることを示している。 また、SynPGの性能は、注釈のないデータが大きい場合には、監督モデルよりも競争力があり、さらに優れていることを実証します。 最後に、SynPGによって生成された構文制御パラフレーズをデータ拡張に利用して、NLPモデルの堅牢性を向上させることができることを示します。', 'zh': '释义生于自然语言(NLP)中起至重之用,而下流之用也。 然训练监督释义模形多带注释义是,常得成本高昂。 其一,见有无监督之法成者释义常于语法上与源句相似,而限以多样性。 本文,证生诸释义于语法,而无注释义是。 吾为语法制之释义生成器(SynPG),盖编码器解码器之规模,可学未尝注文本之合而离句语义语法也。 离令SynPG得操作语法空中嵌以制释义之语法。 以自指标质之广实验明,SynPG善于无监基线行之句法制,而生释义之质有竞争力。 又证当未注数甚大,SynPG性有竞争力,至优于督模。 最后,SynPG生语法制者释义可施于数,以崇NLP之鲁棒性。', 'hi': 'व्याख्या पीढ़ी प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रक्रिया (एनएलपी) में एक आवश्यक भूमिका निभाती है, और इसमें कई डाउनस्ट्रीम अनुप्रयोग हैं। हालांकि, प्रशिक्षण पर्यवेक्षित व्याख्या मॉडल के लिए कई एनोटेट किए गए व्याख्यात्मक जोड़े की आवश्यकता होती है, जो आमतौर पर प्राप्त करने के लिए महंगे होते हैं। दूसरी ओर, मौजूदा असुरक्षित दृष्टिकोणों द्वारा उत्पन्न पैराफ्रेज़ आमतौर पर स्रोत वाक्यों के समान वाक्यात्मक रूप से समान होते हैं और विविधता में सीमित होते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि एनोटेटेड पैराफ्रेज़ जोड़े की आवश्यकता के बिना वाक्यात्मक रूप से विभिन्न पैराफ्रेज़ उत्पन्न करना संभव है। हम वाक्यात्मक रूप से नियंत्रित पैराफ्रेज जेनरेटर (SynPG) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, एक एनकोडर-डिकोडर आधारित मॉडल जो कि शब्दार्थ को अलग करना सीखता है और एक वाक्य के वाक्यविन्यास को अननोटेटेड ग्रंथों के संग्रह से अलग करता है। disentanglement SynPG को वाक्यात्मक स्थान में एम्बेडिंग में हेरफेर करके आउटपुट पैराफ्रेज़ के वाक्यविन्यास को नियंत्रित करने में सक्षम बनाता है। स्वचालित मैट्रिक्स और मानव मूल्यांकन का उपयोग करके व्यापक प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि SynPG असुरक्षित बेसलाइन की तुलना में बेहतर वाक्यात्मक नियंत्रण करता है, जबकि उत्पन्न पैराफ्रेज़ की गुणवत्ता प्रतिस्पर्धी है। हम यह भी प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि SynPG का प्रदर्शन प्रतिस्पर्धी है या पर्यवेक्षित मॉडल से भी बेहतर है जब अननोटेड डेटा बड़ा होता है। अंत में, हम दिखाते हैं कि SynPG द्वारा उत्पन्न वाक्यात्मक रूप से नियंत्रित पैराफ्रेज़ का उपयोग एनएलपी मॉडल की मजबूती में सुधार करने के लिए डेटा वृद्धि के लिए किया जा सकता है।', 'ga': 'Tá ról riachtanach ag giniúint athinsint i bpróiseas teanga nádúrtha (NLP), agus tá go leor feidhmchláir iartheachtacha aige. Mar sin féin, teastaíonn go leor péirí athinsinte anótáilte le hoiliúint a chur ar mhúnlaí athinsinte maoirsithe, rud a bhíonn costasach le fáil de ghnáth. Ar an taobh eile den scéal, is gnách go mbíonn na hailt a ghineann cineálacha cur chuige neamhmhaoirsithe atá ann cheana féin cosúil go comhréir leis na habairtí foinseacha agus tá siad teoranta ó thaobh éagsúlachta de. Sa pháipéar seo, léirímid go bhfuil sé indéanta parafrása éagsúla a ghiniúint go comhréire gan gá le péirí athinsinte anótáilte. Molaimid Gineadóir Athfhrása faoi rialú sytactactically (SynPG), samhail ionchódóra-bhunaithe a fhoghlaimíonn a dhícheangal an tséimeantaic agus comhréir abairte ó bhailiúchán de théacsanna gan nótaí. Cuireann an dícheangal ar chumas SynPG comhréir na hailt aschuir a rialú tríd an neadú sa spás comhréire a ionramháil. Léiríonn turgnaimh fhairsing ag baint úsáide as méadracht uathoibríoch agus meastóireacht dhaonna go ndéanann SynPG rialú comhréire níos fearr ná na bunlínte gan mhaoirseacht, agus go bhfuil cáilíocht na n-athróga a ghintear iomaíoch. Léirímid freisin go bhfuil feidhmíocht SynPG iomaíoch nó níos fearr fós ná samhlacha maoirsithe nuair is mór na sonraí gan nótaí. Mar fhocal scoir, léirímid gur féidir úsáid a bhaint as na hathróga atá rialaithe go síntach a ghineann SynPG chun sonraí a mhéadú chun stóinseacht na samhlacha NLP a fheabhsú.', 'hu': 'A parafráz generálása alapvető szerepet játszik a természetes nyelvi folyamatban (NLP), és számos downstream alkalmazással rendelkezik. A felügyelt parafrázismodellek képzéséhez azonban számos jegyzetelt parafrázispárt igényel, amelyek általában költségesek. Másrészről a meglévő, felügyelet nélküli megközelítések által generált parafrázisok általában szintaktikailag hasonlóak a forrás mondatokhoz, és sokszínűségükben korlátozottak. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk, hogy lehetséges szintaktikailag különböző parafrázisok létrehozása anélkül, hogy jegyzetelt parafrázispárok lennének szükségesek. Szintaktikusan vezérelt Paraphrase Generator (SynPG), egy olyan kódoló-dekódoló alapú modell, amely megtanulja egy mondat szemantikáját és szintaxisát kiválasztani a jelöletlen szövegek gyűjteményéből. A kibontás lehetővé teszi a SynPG számára, hogy szabályozza a kimeneti parafrázisok szintaxisát a beágyazás manipulálásával a szintaktikus térbe. Az automatikus mérésekkel és emberi értékeléssel végzett kiterjedt kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a SynPG jobb szintaktikus vezérlést végez, mint a felügyelet nélküli alapvonalak, miközben a generált parafrázisok minősége versenyképes. Azt is bizonyítjuk, hogy a SynPG teljesítménye versenyképes vagy akár jobb, mint a felügyelt modellek, ha a megjegyzés nélküli adatok nagy. Végül megmutatjuk, hogy a SynPG által generált szintaktikusan vezérelt parafrázisok felhasználhatók adatbővítésre az NLP modellek robusztusságának javítása érdekében.', 'ka': 'პარაფრაზესის განვითარება თავისუფალი ენის პროცესში (NLP) მოთავსდება, და ის აქვს ბევრი კონტრემიური პროგრამები. მაგრამ განაკეთებული პარაფრეზის მოდელები უნდა იყოს რამდენიმე ანოტრეზის პარაფრეზის ზოგი, რომელიც განსაკუთრებულია ძალიან საკმაოდ იყოს. მეორე მხოლოდ, არსებობით განსხვავებული დაწყებების პარაფრაზები უფრო სინტაქტიურად განსხვავებულია, რომლებიც გამოიყენებულია სინტაქტიურად განსხვავებულია. ჩვენ ამ დოკუნტში ჩვენ ევმონსტრაცით, რომ შესაძლებელია სინტაქტიკურად განსხვავებული პარაფრაზების შექმნა, რომელიც არ უნდა დაახლოებით პარაფრაზების ზოგი. ჩვენ სინტექტიკურად კონტროლირებული პარაფრაზის გენერატორი (SynPG), კოდირების გამოსახულებული მოდელი, რომელიც ვისწავლის სინტექტიკის და სინტაქსის გადასრულებას, ანოტირებული ტექსტის კოლექციაზე. სტრიქტურის გადაწყვეტილება SynPG- ს შესაძლებელია სინტაქსის გადასვლის პარაფრაზების სინტაქსის კონტროლეციას, სინტაქტიური სივრცეში გადაყვეტილება. განსაზღვრებული ექსპერიმენტები, რომელიც ავტომატიკური მეტრიკის და ადამიანის განსაზღვრებას გამოყენებული გამოყენება, ჩვენ SynPG უკეთესი სინტაქტიკური კონტროლეციის გავაკეთება, ვიდ ჩვენ ასევე გამოჩვენებთ, რომ SynPG-ის კონპექციენტიური ან უფრო უკეთესია, როდესაც უკეთესია მოდელები, როდესაც უკეთესია მოდელები. საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ სინტაქტიურად კონტროლურებული პარაფრაზები, რომლებიც SynPG-ის შექმნა, შეიძლება გამოყენება მონაცემების აგგენტირებისთვის, რომ NLP მოდე', 'el': 'Η παραγωγή παραφράσεων παίζει σημαντικό ρόλο στη διαδικασία φυσικής γλώσσας (και έχει πολλές μεταγενέστερες εφαρμογές. Ωστόσο, η εκπαίδευση εποπτευόμενων προτύπων παραφράσεων απαιτεί πολλά σχολιασμένα ζεύγη παραφράσεων, τα οποία συνήθως είναι δαπανηρά για την απόκτηση. Από την άλλη πλευρά, οι παραφράσεις που παράγονται από υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις χωρίς επίβλεψη είναι συνήθως συντακτικά παρόμοιες με τις προτάσεις προέλευσης και είναι περιορισμένες σε ποικιλομορφία. Στην παρούσα εργασία, καταδεικνύουμε ότι είναι δυνατόν να δημιουργηθούν συντακτικά διάφορες παραφράσεις χωρίς την ανάγκη σχολιασμένων ζευγαριών παραφράσεων. Προτείνουμε τη Συντακτικά ελεγχόμενη Παράφραση (ένα μοντέλο βασισμένο στον κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή που μαθαίνει να διαχωρίζει τη σημασιολογία και τη σύνταξη μιας πρότασης από μια συλλογή απρογραμμάτιστων κειμένων. Η αποσύνδεση επιτρέπει στο SynPG να ελέγχει τη σύνταξη των παραφράσεων εξόδου με χειρισμό της ενσωμάτωσης στον συντακτικό χώρο. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα που χρησιμοποιούν αυτόματες μετρήσεις και ανθρώπινη αξιολόγηση δείχνουν ότι η SynPG εκτελεί καλύτερο συντακτικό έλεγχο από τις μη εποπτικές γραμμές βάσης, ενώ η ποιότητα των παραγόμενων παραφράσεων είναι ανταγωνιστική. Αποδεικνύουμε επίσης ότι η απόδοση του είναι ανταγωνιστική ή ακόμα καλύτερη από τα εποπτευόμενα μοντέλα όταν τα μη σημειωμένα δεδομένα είναι μεγάλα. Τέλος, δείχνουμε ότι οι συντακτικά ελεγχόμενες παραφράσεις που παράγονται από το SynPG μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν για την αύξηση δεδομένων για τη βελτίωση της ανθεκτικότητας των μοντέλων NLP.', 'it': "La generazione di parafrasi svolge un ruolo essenziale nel processo di linguaggio naturale (NLP), e ha molte applicazioni a valle. Tuttavia, la formazione di modelli di parafrasi supervisionati richiede molte coppie di parafrasi annotate, che di solito sono costose da ottenere. D'altra parte, le parafrase generate da approcci non supervisionati esistenti sono solitamente sintatticamente simili alle frasi di origine e sono limitate nella diversità. In questo articolo, dimostriamo che è possibile generare sintatticamente varie parafrasi senza la necessità di coppie di parafrasi annotate. Proponiamo Paraphrase Generator (SynPG), un modello basato su encoder-decoder che impara a districare la semantica e la sintassi di una frase da una raccolta di testi non notati. Lo scollegamento consente a SynPG di controllare la sintassi delle parafrase di output manipolando l'incorporamento nello spazio sintattico. Esperimenti approfonditi che utilizzano metriche automatiche e valutazione umana mostrano che SynPG esegue un controllo sintattico migliore rispetto alle linee di base non supervisionate, mentre la qualità delle parafrase generate è competitiva. Dimostriamo inoltre che le prestazioni di SynPG sono competitive o addirittura migliori dei modelli supervisionati quando i dati non notati sono grandi. Infine, mostriamo che le parafrase sintatticamente controllate generate da SynPG possono essere utilizzate per l'aumento dei dati per migliorare la robustezza dei modelli NLP.", 'mk': 'Генерацијата на парафрази игра суштинска улога во природниот јазик процес (НЛП) и има многу понатамошни апликации. Сепак, обуката на надгледуваните парафразни модели бара многу анотирани пара парафрази, кои обично се скапи за добивање. On the other hand, the paraphrases generated by existing unsupervised approaches are usually syntactically similar to the source sentences and are limited in diversity.  In this paper, we demonstrate that it is possible to generate syntactically various paraphrases without the need for annotated paraphrase pairs.  Ние предложуваме синтактички контролиран генератор на парафрази (SynPG), модел базиран на кодер-декодер кој научи да ја раздвои семантиката и синтаксиката на реченицата од колекција незабележани тексти. Раскинувањето овозможува СинГП да ја контролира синтаксата на излезните парафрази со манипулирање на вградувањето во синтактичкиот простор. Експериментите со автоматска метрика и човечка проценка покажуваат дека SynPG извршува подобра синтактичка контрола отколку ненадгледувани бази линии, додека квалитетот на генерираните парафрази е конкурентен. Исто така, демонстрираме дека изведувањето на SynPG е конкурентно или дури подобро од надгледуваните модели кога незабележаните податоци се големи. Конечно, покажуваме дека синтактички контролираните парафрази генерирани од SynPG може да се искористат за зголемување на податоците за подобрување на силноста на моделите на NLP.', 'lt': 'Parafrazių kūrimas atlieka esminį vaidmenį gamtinės kalbos procese (NLP) ir turi daug tolesnių programų. Tačiau mokymo prižiūrimi parafrazių modeliai reikalauja daug užrašytų parafrazių poros, kurios paprastai yra brangios. Kita vertus, pagal esamus nepastebimus metodus sukurtos parafrazės paprastai sintetiškai panašios į pradinius sakinius ir yra ribotos įvairovės. Šiame dokumente parodomi, kad galima sintetiškai sukurti įvairias parafrazes be poreikio anotuoti parafrazės poras. Siūlome sintaktiškai kontroliuojamą parafrazių generatorių (SynPG), kodavimo dekoderio pagrindu pagrįstą model į, kuris išmoko išstumti semantiką ir sakinio sintaksą iš nenotiruotų tekstų rinkinio. Atskyrimas leidžia SynPG kontroliuoti išėjimo parafrazių sintaksą manipuliuojant įdėjimu į sintaksinę erdvę. Išsamūs eksperimentai, kuriuose naudojamos automatinės metrijos ir žmogaus vertinimas, rodo, kad SynPG atlieka geresnę sintaktinę kontrolę nei nepastebimos bazinės linijos, o sukurtų parafrazių kokybė yra konkurencinga. Taip pat įrodome, kad SynPG veiklos rezultatai yra konkurencingi arba net geresni nei prižiūrimi modeliai, kai nenustatyti duomenys yra dideli. Galiausiai parodome, kad SynPG sukauptas sintetiškai kontroliuojamas parafrazes galima naudoti duomenų didinimui siekiant pagerinti NLP modelių patikimumą.', 'kk': 'Парафразды құру табиғи тіл процесінде (NLP) негізгі рольді орындайды және оның көп бағытталған қолданбалары бар. Бірақ бұл парафраз үлгілерін бақылау үшін көптеген парафраз үлгілерін қажет етеді. Әдетте оларды алу үшін көптеген парафраз үлгілері керек. Біріншіден, бар жағдайда қолданылмаған арқылы құрылған парафразлар кәдімгі көзінде синтактикалық сөздерге ұқсас болып, әртүрлі сөздерге шектелген. Бұл қағазда, синтактикалық түрлі парафразтарды жасау мүмкін екенін көрсетеді. Бұл парафраз екеуі қажетті болмаса, синтактикалық түрлі парафразтарды құру мүмкін. Біз синтактикалық бақылау парафраз генераторы (SynPG) дегенді, кодер- декодер негіздеген үлгісін қолданамыз. Бұл синтактиканы және сөздің синтаксисін белгілмеген мәтіндерді жинақтау үшін үйренеді. Бұрыштыру синтаксисін синтаксис орында ендіру арқылы синтаксисін баптау үшін Қадамдастыру парафразтарының синтаксисін басқаруға мүмкіндік береді. Автоматты метрикалық және адамдардың бағалауын қолданатын кеңейтілген тәжірибелер синтактикалық контроллерді бағытталмаған негізгі сызықтардан артық контроллерді көрсетеді, бірақ құрылған парафразтардың сапа Қосымша, SynPG жұмыс істеуі көмектесілмеген деректер үлкен болғанда немесе басқару үлгілерінен артық дегенді көрсетеді. Соңында, SynPG құрылған синтактикалық контроллердің парафразтарын NLP үлгілерінің дұрыстығын жақсарту үшін деректерді көптеу үшін қолданылады.', 'ms': 'Generasi parafrasa bermain peran penting dalam proses bahasa semulajadi (NLP), dan ia mempunyai banyak aplikasi turun. Namun, model parafrasa yang diawasi latihan memerlukan banyak pasangan parafrasa yang dicatat, yang biasanya mahal untuk dicapai. Di sisi lain, parafrasa yang dihasilkan oleh pendekatan tidak diawasi yang wujud biasanya secara sintaktik sama dengan kalimat sumber dan terhad dalam pelbagai. Dalam kertas ini, kita menunjukkan bahawa ia adalah mungkin untuk menghasilkan berbeza parafrasa secara sintaktik tanpa perlukan pasangan parafrasa yang dicatat. Kami cadangkan Penjana Parafrasa yang dikawal secara Sintaktik (SynPG), model berdasarkan pengekod-dekoder yang belajar untuk melepaskan semantik dan sintaks kalimat dari koleksi teks yang tidak dicatat. Pembatasan membolehkan SynPG mengawal sintaks parafrasa output dengan memanipulasi penyembedding dalam ruang sintaks. Eksperimen luas menggunakan metrik automatik dan penilaian manusia menunjukkan bahawa SynPG melakukan kawalan sintaktik yang lebih baik daripada garis dasar tidak diawasi, sementara kualiti parafrasa yang dijana adalah bersaing. Kami juga menunjukkan bahawa prestasi SynPG adalah kompetitif atau bahkan lebih baik daripada model yang diawasi apabila data yang tidak dicatat besar. Akhirnya, kami tunjukkan bahawa parafrasa yang dikawal secara sintaktik yang dijana oleh SynPG boleh digunakan untuk peningkatan data untuk meningkatkan kepekatan model NLP.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл процесс (NLP) дээр шаардлагатай байдаг. Байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэл нь олон доорх хэрэглэгдэлтэй. Гэхдээ сургалтын удирдлагатай параграфийн загвар нь олон анзаарсан параграфийн хоёр шаардлагатай. Энэ нь ихэвчлэн үнэтэй. Өөрөөр хэлбэл, сууж байгаагүй арга барилгуудын гаргасан парафрейз нь ихэвчлэн эх үүсвэрийн өгүүлбэртэй ижил болон олон янзаар хязгаарлагддаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид синтактик хэлбэрүүдийг бий болгох боломжтой гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бид Синтактик хяналттай Парафрейз Генератор (SynPG), кодлогч-декодлогч суурилсан загварыг суралцдаг. Земантик болон шинжлэх ухааны шинжлэх ухаан нь анзааргүй текстүүдийн цуглуулалтын шинжлэх ухаан юм. Тайлбарлалт нь синтактикийн орон зайд орлуулах синтаксисын синтаксисийг хянах боломжтой болгодог. Өнгөрсөн туршилтууд автоматжуулан метрик болон хүн төрөлхтний дүгнэлтийг ашиглаж байгаа нь SynPG нь суурь шулуунуудаас илүү синтактик хяналт хийдэг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Гэхдээ үүсгэсэн парафразын чанар нь өрсөлдөө Бид мөн SynPG-ын үйл ажиллагаа нь өрсөлдөөнтэй эсвэл удирдагдсан загвараас ч илүү сайн байдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Эцэст нь, бид SynPG-ын гарсан синтактикийн хяналттай парафразуудыг NLP загварын хүчтэй байдлыг сайжруулахын тулд өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэлт ашиглаж болно.', 'ml': 'പാരാഫ്രസ് തലമുറകള്\u200d സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ (NLP) പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പങ്ക് കളിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ പ് എങ്കിലും പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെടുത്തിയ പാരാഫ്രേസ് മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരുപാട് പ്രശ്നമുണ്ട്, പാരാഫ്രേസ് ജോട്ടുകാരെ ആവശ് മറുവശത്ത്, നിലവിലുള്ള സൂക്ഷിക്കാത്ത നടപടികളാല്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയ വാക്കുകള്\u200d സാധാരണയായി സോര്\u200dസ്സ് വാക്കുകള്\u200d പോലെയാണ്. വ്യത്യസ്ത വ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, സാധ്യതയില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യമല്ലെന്ന്. പാരാഫ്രേസ് ജോടി സിന്\u200dടാക്കിക്കല്\u200d നിയന്ത്രിക്കപ്പെട്ട പാരാഫ്രാസ് ജനററേറ്റര്\u200d (സിന്\u200dപിജി), ഒരു കോഡോര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി നിയന്ത്രിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d, സെമാന്\u200dടിക്സിനെ പുറപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന പാരാഫ്രസ്സുകളുടെ സിന്\u200dട്രാക്സ് നിയന്ത്രിക്കാന്\u200d സിന്\u200dപിജിയെ സിന്\u200dട്രാക്സ് ചെയ്യുന്നത് സ സംരക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങളെക്കാള്\u200d സിന്\u200dപിജി സിന്\u200dട്രാക്ടിക് നിയന്ത്രണത്തെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു. സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്ന പാരാഫ്രേഷങ്ങളു നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ഡേറ്റാ വലുതാണെങ്കില്\u200d സിന്\u200dപിജിയുടെ പ്രകടനം മത്സരിക്കുന്നതോ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d മോഡലുകളെക്കാള Finally, we show that the syntactically controlled paraphrases generated by SynPG can be utilized for data augmentation to improve the robustness of NLP models.', 'mt': 'Il-ġenerazzjoni tal-parafrażi għandha rwol essenzjali fil-proċess tal-lingwa naturali (NLP), u għandha ħafna applikazzjonijiet downstream. However, training supervised paraphrase models requires many annotated paraphrase pairs, which are usually costly to obtain.  Min-naħa l-oħra, il-parafrażijiet iġġenerati minn approċċi eżistenti mhux sorveljati huma ġeneralment sintetikament simili għas-sentenzi tas-sors u huma limitati fid-diversità. F’dan id-dokument, qed nippruvaw li huwa possibbli li jiġu ġġenerati parafrażijiet sintetikament varji mingħajr il-ħtieġa għal pari ta’ parafrażijiet annotati. Aħna nipproponu Ġeneratur ta’ Parafrażijiet ikkontrollat b’mod sintattiku (SynPG), mudell ibbażat fuq id-dekoder tal-kodiċi li jitgħallem jiżżarma s-semantika u s-sintaks ta’ sentenza minn ġabra ta’ testi mhux innotati. L-iżżarmar jippermetti lil SynPG jikkontrolla s-sintaks tal-parafrażijiet tal-ħruġ billi jimmanipula l-inkorporazzjoni fl-ispazju sintetiku. Esperimenti estensivi li jużaw metriċi awtomatiċi u evalwazzjoni tal-bniedem juru li SynPG iwettaq kontroll sintetiku aħjar minn linji bażi mhux sorveljati, filwaqt li l-kwalità tal-parafrażijiet iġġenerati hija kompetittiva. Jiġu murija wkoll li l-prestazzjoni ta’ SynPG hija kompetittiva jew saħansitra aħjar mill-mudelli sorveljati meta d-dejta mhux innotata tkun kbira. Fl-aħħar nett, nuru li l-parafrażijiet ikkontrollati b’mod sintetiku ġġenerati minn SynPG jistgħu jintużaw għal żieda fid-dejta biex itejbu s-robustezza tal-mudelli NLP.', 'no': 'Parafrase-generering spelar ein grunnleggjande rolle i naturspråkprosess (NLP), og han har mange nedstrekingsprogrammer. Men treningsmodeller som er overvåka av parafrasar krev mange merkte parafrasar, som vanlegvis er kost for å få. På den andre siden er parafrasene genererte av eksisterande uavhengige tilnærmingar vanlegvis syntaksisk liknande med kjeldesetningane og er begrenset i mangfolda. I denne papiret viser vi at det er mogleg å laga ulike parafraser utan nødvendighet for markerte parafrasar. Vi foreslår syntaksisk kontrollert Parafrase- generering (SynPG), ein koderingsbasert modell som lærer å forstørra semantikkane og syntaksen av eit setning frå eit samling av ikkje- identifiserte tekstar. Desentasjonen slår på at SynPG kan kontrollera syntaksen av utskriftsparafraser ved å manipulera innbygginga i syntaksplassen. Ekstra eksperimenter med automatisk metrikn og menneskelige evaluering viser at SynPG utfører betre syntaksiske kontroll enn ulike baselinjer, mens kvaliteten av dei genererte parafrasene er konkurrentivt. Vi viser også at utviklinga av SynPG er konkurrentivt eller til og med bedre enn overvakte modeller når data ikkje er stor. I slutt viser vi at dei syntaksiske kontrollerte parafrasene som er genererte av SynPG kan brukast for å økja data for å forbetra styrken av NLP-modeller.', 'pl': 'Generowanie parafraz odgrywa istotną rolę w procesie języka naturalnego (NLP) i ma wiele dalszych aplikacji. Jednak szkolenie nadzorowanych modeli parafraz wymaga wielu adnotacji parafraz, które zwykle są kosztowne w uzyskaniu. Z drugiej strony parafrazy generowane przez istniejące podejścia bez nadzoru są zwykle składniowo podobne do zdań źródłowych i są ograniczone różnorodnością. W artykule pokazujemy, że możliwe jest generowanie składniowo różnych parafraz bez konieczności stosowania adnotacji parafraz. Proponujemy Syntaktycznie sterowany generator parafraz (SynPG), model oparty na koderze-dekoderze, który uczy się rozłączać semantykę i składnię zdania z zbioru niezapisanych tekstów. Rozłączenie umożliwia SynPG kontrolowanie składni parafraz wyjściowych poprzez manipulowanie osadzeniem w przestrzeni składni. Obszerne eksperymenty z wykorzystaniem automatycznych metryk i oceny ludzkiej pokazują, że SynPG wykonuje lepszą kontrolę składni niż bez nadzoru linii bazowych, podczas gdy jakość generowanych parafraz jest konkurencyjna. Wykazujemy również, że wydajność SynPG jest konkurencyjna lub nawet lepsza niż modele nadzorowane, gdy niezapisane dane są duże. Wreszcie pokazujemy, że parafrazy sterowane składnią generowane przez SynPG mogą być wykorzystane do powiększania danych w celu poprawy solidności modeli NLP.', 'sr': 'Generacija parafraza igra ključnu ulogu u procesu prirodnog jezika (NLP), i ima mnogo prijava. Međutim, obrazovanje nadgledanih parafraza zahteva mnoge annotirane parove parafraze, koje su obično skupe za dobivanje. Sa druge strane, parafraze koje su stvorene postojećim neodređenim pristupima obično su sintaktično slične izvornim rečenicama i ograničene u raznolikosti. U ovom papiru pokazujemo da je moguće stvoriti sintaktički različite parafraze bez potrebe za annotiranim parovima parafraze. Предлагамо синтактично контролиран генератор парафразе (СинPG), базирани модел кодера-декодера који научи да размахне семантику и синтаксу реченица из колекције неантитираних текста. Desentacija omogućava SynPG da kontrolira sintaks izlaznih parafraza manipulirajući uključenje u sintaktički prostor. Eksperimenti koji koriste automatsku metriku i ljudsku procjenu pokazuju da SynPG izvodi bolju sintaktičnu kontrolu od neodređenih osnovnih linija, dok je kvalitet proizvedenih parafraza konkurentna. Takođe pokazujemo da je učinkovitost SynPG konkurentna ili čak bolje od nadzornih modela kada su neobični podaci veliki. Konačno, pokazujemo da sintaktički kontrolirane parafraze koje je stvorio SynPG mogu biti korištene za povećanje podataka kako bi poboljšali robotu NLP modela.', 'ro': 'Generarea de parafraze joacă un rol esențial în procesul de limbaj natural (PNL), și are multe aplicații în aval. Cu toate acestea, formarea modelelor de parafrază supravegheate necesită multe perechi de parafrază adnotate, care sunt de obicei costisitoare de obținut. Pe de altă parte, parafrazele generate de abordările nesupravegheate existente sunt de obicei similare sintactic cu propozițiile sursă și sunt limitate în diversitate. În această lucrare, demonstrăm că este posibil să se genereze sintactic diferite parafraze fără a fi nevoie de perechi de parafraze adnotate. Propunem Generatorul Paraphrase controlat sintactic (SynPG), un model bazat pe encoder-decoder care invata sa dezlege semantica si sintaxa unei propozitii dintr-o colectie de texte neanotate. Dezinstalarea permite SynPG să controleze sintaxa parafrazelor de ieșire prin manipularea încorporării în spațiul sintactic. Experimentele extinse utilizând metrici automate și evaluarea umană arată că SynPG efectuează un control sintactic mai bun decât liniile de bază nesupravegheate, în timp ce calitatea parafrazelor generate este competitivă. De asemenea, demonstrăm că performanța SynPG este competitivă sau chiar mai bună decât modelele supravegheate atunci când datele neanotate sunt mari. În cele din urmă, arătăm că parafrazele controlate sintactic generate de SynPG pot fi utilizate pentru mărirea datelor pentru a îmbunătăți robustețea modelelor NLP.', 'so': 'Qarniga Paraphrase waxay leedahay qayb muhiim ah oo ku qoran jardiinada afka dabiicadda ah (NLP), waxayna leedahay codsiyo badan oo hoos u socda. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxbarashada qaababka fasaxa la ilaaliyo waxay u baahan yihiin noocyo badan oo lammaano la dhibaataysan, kuwaas oo inta badan qaali karo. Sida kale, qeybaha lagu soo bandhigi karo qaababka aan la ilaalin karin waa sida caadiga ah si isku mid ah xukunka asalka iyo si kala duduwan. Qoraalkan waxaynu muujinnaa in suurtogal ah in lagu sameyn karo marxalado kala duduwan, iyadoon u baahnayn baahida labada qof oo isku mid ah. Waxaan horumarinaynaa dhaqanka Paraphrase (SynPG) oo u qoran qoraal koodeynta ah oo ku qoran qoraalka a an la aqoonin. Qashinka waxaa ka caawinaya SynPG in la maamulo qashinka soo bixinta, iyadoo lagu maamulayo mid ka mid ah meesha isbitaalka ah. Imtixaano dheeraad ah oo isticmaalaya isticmaalka maamulka iyo qiimeynta dadku waxay muuqataa in SynPG uu sameeyo kontroll ka fiican qoraalka aan la ilaalinayn, iyadoo ay is-taxadar u leedahay baaritaanka soo saaray. Sidoo kale waxaynu muujinnaa in sameynta SynPG ay is-qabsato ama ay ka fiican tahay tusaalooyin la ilaaliyo marka macluumaadka aan la aqoon lahayn ay wayn tahay. Ugu dambaysta waxaan tusnaynaa in heerarka synPG-ka soo dhashay looga isticmaali karo kordhinta macluumaadka si uu u hagaajiyo dhaqdhaqaaqa modellada NLP.', 'ta': 'Paraphrase தலைமுறை இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாட்டில் ஒரு முக்கியமான பங்கை விளையாடுகிறது, மற்றும் அதில் பல கீழ் தள்ளும் பயன்ப ஆயினும், பராமரிக்கப்பட்ட சொற்றொடர் மாதிரிகளுக்கு பல தேவையான சொற்றொடர் ஜோடி தேவை மற்றொரு பக்கத்தில், இருக்காத சேமிக்கப்படாத முறைகளால் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட சொற்றொடர்கள் வழக்கமாக மூல வாக்கியங்களுடன் ஒத்திசைப்படுத் இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் அது ஒத்திசைக்கு பல்வேறு வாக்கியங்களை உருவாக்க முடியும் நாம் ஒத்திசைக்காக கட்டுப்படுத்தப்படுத்தப்பட்ட Paraphrase உருவாக்கி (SynPG), குறிமுறையாக்கி அடிப்படையிலான குறியீட்டாளர் மாதிரியை கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் பெம் ஒத்திசைவு ஒத்திசைவு வெளியீட்டு அளபுருக்களின் ஒத்திசைவை கட்டுப்படுத்தும் ஒத்திசைவை ஒத்திசைவு செய்ய இயலும காப்பாற்றப்படாத அடிப்படைகளை விட சிறந்த ஒத்திசைவு கட்டுப்பாட்டை செய்கிறது என்று தானாகவே மெட்ரிக்கள் மற்றும் மனித மதிப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தும் விர தெரியாத தகவல் பெரியதாக இருக்கும் போது சிந்பிஜி செயல்பாடு போராட்டியாக இருக்கும் அல்லது கண்காணிக்கப்படாத மாதிரிகளை  இறுதியில், நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் என்றால், SynPG உருவாக்கப்பட்ட ஒத்திசைக்கு கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்ட அளபுருக்களை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு தரவு மே', 'si': 'පැරැෆ්\u200dරේස් ජීවිතේ ස්වභාවික භාෂාව (NLP) වලට අවශ්\u200dය භාවිතාවක් සැලසුම් කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ඒක නමුත්, ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණ පැරපේස් මොඩල් අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා වගේම පැරපේස් දෙන්න, ඒක සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dර අනිත් පැත්තෙන්, විශේෂ වාක්ෂාවක් තියෙන්නේ නැති විශේෂ විදිහට නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ නැති විදිහට සමා මේ පත්තරේ අපි පෙන්වන්නම් වෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, සංකේතික විවිධ පැරප්\u200dරේස් නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා අපි සංවිධානයෙන් පාරප්\u200dරවේශ ජීනේටර් (SynPG) ප්\u200dරවේශ කරනවා, සංවිධානයෙන් සංවිධානය කරනවා, සංවිධානයෙන් සංවිධානය කරන්න සිද්ධ සංවිධානය සක්\u200dරීය කරන්න පුළුවන් පැරැෆ්රේස් වලගේ සංවිධානය පාලනය කරන්න SynPG සක්\u200dරීය කරන්න පුළුවන්. ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් සහ මිනිස්සු විශ්ලේෂණය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පෙන්වන්නේ SynPG වඩා හොඳ සංක්\u200dරියාත්මක පාල අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා SynPG ගේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය තර්ජනය කරනවා නැත්නම් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙනවා නැත්නම් දත්ත ලොකු වෙලාවට වඩ අන්තිමේදි, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ SynPG වලින් නිර්මාණය කරපු සංකේතය පාරප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් තොරතුරු වැඩ කරන්න NLP මො', 'sv': 'Parafrasgenerering spelar en viktig roll i naturlig språkprocess (NLP), och det har många nedströms applikationer. Men utbildning övervakade parafrasmodeller kräver många kommenterade parafraspar, som vanligtvis är dyra att få tag i. Å andra sidan är parafraserna som genereras av befintliga icke övervakade tillvägagångssätt vanligtvis syntaktiskt liknande källmeningarna och är begränsade till mångfald. I denna uppsats visar vi att det är möjligt att generera syntaktiskt olika parafraser utan behov av kommenterade parafraser. Vi föreslår Syntaktiskt kontrollerad Paraphrase Generator (SynPG), en encoder-avkodare baserad modell som lär sig att lösa semantiken och syntaxen för en mening från en samling av oannoterade texter. Avbrytningen gör det möjligt för SynPG att styra syntaxen för utdataparafraser genom att manipulera inbäddningen i det syntaktiska utrymmet. Omfattande experiment med automatiska mätvärden och mänsklig utvärdering visar att SynPG presterar bättre syntaktisk kontroll än oövervakade baslinjer, medan kvaliteten på de genererade parafraserna är konkurrenskraftig. Vi visar också att SynPG:s prestanda är konkurrenskraftig eller till och med bättre än övervakade modeller när de oanmälda uppgifterna är stora. Slutligen visar vi att de syntaktiskt kontrollerade parafraser som genereras av SynPG kan användas för dataökning för att förbättra robustheten hos NLP-modeller.', 'ur': 'Paraphrase generation plays an essential role in natural language process (NLP), and it has many downstream applications. However, training supervised paraphrase models requires many annotated paraphrase pairs, which are usually expensive to obtain. دوسری طرف، موجود غیر قابل تحقیقات کے ذریعے پیدا ہوئے پارافریزے معمولاً سورج جماعت کے مطابق سینٹاکٹی طور پر ہیں اور مختلف طریقوں میں محدود ہیں. ہم اس کاغذ میں دکھاتے ہیں کہ سینٹاکیٹی طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح کے پارافریز جوڑوں کی ضرورت کے بغیر. ہم سینکٹیکیٹ کے ساتھ کنترل پارافریز جینراٹر (SynPG) کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، ایک اکوڈر-ڈیکوڈر بنیادی موڈل جو سیمانٹیکس اور ایک جماعت کی سینٹکس کو ناشناختہ پیغام کے مجموعہ سے چھوڑ سکتا ہے۔ سٹانٹنگل سینپیگ کو سینٹاکسی جگہ میں انڈیڈنگ کی سینٹکس کو کنٹرول کرنے کے لئے امکان دیتا ہے. آٹوٹ میٹریک اور انسان کی ارزیابی کے مطابق استعمال کرنے والی آزمائش دکھاتی ہے کہ SynPG ناپابندی بنسٹلین سے بہتر سینٹکتیک کنٹرول کرتا ہے، حالانکہ پیدا کئے ہوئے پارافریز کی کیفیت مسابقه ہے. ہم بھی دکھاتے ہیں کہ SynPG کا عمل مسابقه ہے یا اس سے بھی بہتر ہے جب غیر معلوم ہونے والی ڈاٹی بڑی ہوتی ہے۔ آخر میں، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ سینپیج سے پیدا ہوئے سینٹاکٹی کے ساتھ کنترل کی پارافریز ڈیٹا اضافہ کرنے کے لئے استعمال کر سکتے ہیں کہ NLP موڈلز کی طاقت کے ساتھ اضافہ کرنے کے لئے۔', 'uz': "Paraphrase generation plays an essential role in natural language process (NLP), and it has many downstream applications.  Lekin, taʼminlovchi paraphras modellariga ko'pchilik paraphras qoʻllari kerak. Bu odatda olishga qiymatdir. Boshqa bir tomonda, mavjud saqlanmagan usullar yaratiladigan paraphraslar odatda manba soʻzlar bir xil so'zlariga oʻxshash va har xil soʻzlarda chegara. Bu qogʻozda biz bir xil paraphraslarni birlashtirish kerak emas, bir xil paraphraslarni yaratish mumkin. Biz Paraphrase Generator (SynPG) bilan birlashtirilgan imkoniyatlarni tahlil qilamiz. Kodlash asosiy modeli, semantik va bir so'zni tanlanmagan matnlarni birlashtirishni o'rganadi. Name Name Шунингдек, Биз ҳам кўрсатамиз, синпция жиҳатиси катта маълумотлар сифатида назар солиб бўлмаган modelлардан яхшироқдир ёки ҳам яхшироқдир. Endi biz synPG yaratilgan sintaktika boshqaruvchi paraphraslarni ishlatish mumkin, NLP modellarining robustiyasini oshirish uchun maʼlumot yordamida foydalanishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Thế hệ thành từ cụm từ đóng một vai trò quan trọng trong quá trình ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (NLP) và nó có nhiều ứng dụng xuôi dòng. Tuy nhiên, sự huấn luyện theo trình diễn giải bị giám sát đòi hỏi nhiều cặp diễn giải được ghi chú, mà thường rất tốn kém để đạt được. Mặt khác, các diễn văn được tạo ra bởi các phương pháp không giám sát hiện tại thường tương tự với các câu từ nguồn và hạn chế trong đa dạng. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi chứng minh rằng có thể tạo ra các diễn văn khác nhau mà không cần các hình ảnh liệt được ghi chú. Chúng tôi đề xuất một kiểu Thế hệ Paracụm từ được điều khiển theo lập pháp (SynPG), một mô hình có nền mã hóa để học cách tách biệt ngữ pháp và cú pháp của một câu từ một bộ sưu tập các văn bản không ghi chú. Sự rối loạn làm cho SynPG có khả năng điều khiển cấu trúc của các đoạn trích xuất bằng cách thao túng sự nhúng vào không gian cấu tạo cú pháp. Những thí nghiệm rộng rãi bằng đo tử tự động và đánh giá con người cho thấy SynPG thực hiện điều khiển cú pháp tốt hơn các đường hầm không giám sát, trong khi chất lượng của các liệt giải được tạo ra cạnh tranh. Chúng tôi cũng chứng minh rằng hiệu quả của Synequanon là cạnh tranh hay thậm chí còn tốt hơn những mẫu được giám sát khi dữ liệu không được ghi chú là lớn. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi cho thấy các diễn văn được kiểm soát cấu tạo bởi SynPG có thể được dùng cho việc gia tăng dữ liệu để nâng cao độ bền vững của mô- đun lập dị.', 'nl': 'Parafrase generatie speelt een essentiële rol in het natuurlijke taalproces (NLP), en het heeft veel downstream toepassingen. Het trainen van begeleide parafrasemmodellen vereist echter veel geannoteerde parafrasemparen, die meestal duur zijn om te verkrijgen. Aan de andere kant zijn de parafrases gegenereerd door bestaande onbeheerde benaderingen meestal syntactisch vergelijkbaar met de bronzinnen en beperkt in diversiteit. In dit artikel laten we zien dat het mogelijk is om syntactisch verschillende parafrases te genereren zonder de noodzaak van geannoteerde parafraseparen. We stellen Syntactisch gecontroleerde Paraphrase Generator (SynPG) voor, een op encoder-decoder gebaseerd model dat leert om de semantiek en de syntaxis van een zin te ontkoppelen uit een verzameling van ongenoteerde teksten. De ontkoppeling stelt SynPG in staat om de syntaxis van uitvoerparafrases te controleren door de inbedding in de syntactische ruimte te manipuleren. Uitgebreide experimenten met automatische metrics en menselijke evaluatie tonen aan dat SynPG een betere syntactische controle uitvoert dan onbeheerde baselines, terwijl de kwaliteit van de gegenereerde parafrases concurrerend is. We tonen ook aan dat de prestaties van SynPG concurrerend zijn of zelfs beter dan begeleide modellen wanneer de onbenoteerde gegevens groot zijn. Ten slotte laten we zien dat de syntactisch gecontroleerde parafrases gegenereerd door SynPG kunnen worden gebruikt voor data augmentatie om de robuustheid van NLP modellen te verbeteren.', 'da': "Paraphrase generation spiller en væsentlig rolle i naturlig sprogproces (NLP), og det har mange downstream applikationer. Uddannelse af overvågede parafrasemodeller kræver imidlertid mange kommenterede parafrasepar, som normalt er dyre at opnå. Til gengæld ligner de parafraser, der genereres af eksisterende ikke-overvågede tilgange, normalt syntaktisk de samme kildesætninger og er begrænset i mangfoldighed. I denne artikel viser vi, at det er muligt at generere syntaktisk forskellige parafraser uden behov for kommenterede parafrasepar. Vi foreslår Syntaktical kontrolleret Paraphrase Generator (SynPG), en encoder-dekoder baseret model, der lærer at afbryde semantikken og syntaksen af en sætning fra en samling af uannoterede tekster. Afdelingen gør det muligt for SynPG at styre syntaksen for outputparafraser ved at manipulere indlejringen i det syntaktiske rum. Omfattende eksperimenter ved hjælp af automatiske målinger og menneskelig evaluering viser, at SynPG udfører bedre syntaktisk kontrol end ubevågede basislinjer, mens kvaliteten af de genererede parafraser er konkurrencedygtig. Vi demonstrerer også, at SynPG's ydeevne er konkurrencedygtige eller endda bedre end overvågede modeller, når de unannoterede data er store. Endelig viser vi, at de syntaktisk styrede parafraser genereret af SynPG kan bruges til dataaugmentation for at forbedre robustheden af NLP modeller.", 'hr': 'Generacija parafraza igra ključnu ulogu u procesu prirodnog jezika (NLP) i ima mnogo nužnih primjena. Međutim, modeli obrazovanja nadziranih parafraza zahtijevaju mnoge annotirane parafraze, koje su obično skupe za dobivanje. S druge strane, parafraze koje su proizvedene postojećim nepotrebnim pristupima obično su sintaktički slične izvornim rečenicama i ograničene u raznolikosti. U ovom papiru pokazujemo da je moguće proizvesti sintaktički različite parafraze bez potrebe za annotiranim parafrazom par. Predlažemo sintaktički kontrolirani Generator Parafraze (SynPG), model bazirani na koderu i dekoderu koji nauči da uključuje semantiku i sintaks rečenice iz kolekcije neoznačenih tekstova. Raspuštanje omogućava SynPG da kontrolira sintaks izlaznih parafraza manipulirajući uključenje u sintaktički prostor. Prošireni eksperimenti koristeći automatsku metriku i ljudsku procjenu pokazuju da SynPG provodi bolju sintaktičku kontrolu od neodređenih početnih linija, dok je kvalitet proizvedenih parafraza konkurentna. Također pokazujemo da je učinkovito SynPG konkurentno ili čak bolje od nadzornih modela kada su neobični podaci veliki. Konačno, pokazujemo da se sintaktički kontrolirane parafraze koje proizvode SynPG mogu iskoristiti za povećanje podataka kako bi poboljšali robotu NLP modela.', 'id': 'Paraphrase generation plays an essential role in natural language process (NLP), and it has many downstream applications.  Namun, pelatihan model parafrasa yang diawasi membutuhkan banyak pasangan parafrasa yang dicatat, yang biasanya mahal untuk mendapatkan. Di sisi lain, parafrasa yang dihasilkan oleh pendekatan tidak diawasi yang ada biasanya secara sintaks mirip dengan kalimat sumber dan terbatas dalam kebanyakan. Dalam kertas ini, kami menunjukkan bahwa mungkin untuk menghasilkan berbagai parafrasa secara sintaks tanpa membutuhkan pasangan parafrasa yang dicatat. Kami mengusulkan Syntactically controlled Paraphrase Generator (SynPG), sebuah model berdasarkan decoder-decoder yang belajar untuk melepaskan semantik dan sintaks kalimat dari koleksi teks yang tidak dicatat. Pembatasan memungkinkan SynPG untuk mengendalikan sintaks parafrasa keluaran dengan memanipulasi penyambungan dalam ruang sintaks. Eksperimen ekstensif menggunakan metrik otomatis dan evaluasi manusia menunjukkan bahwa SynPG melakukan kontrol sintaks yang lebih baik daripada garis dasar tidak diawasi, sementara kualitas parafrasa yang dihasilkan adalah kompetitif. Kami juga menunjukkan bahwa prestasi SynPG adalah kompetitif atau bahkan lebih baik dari model yang diawasi ketika data yang tidak dicatat besar. Akhirnya, kami menunjukkan bahwa parafrasa yang dikontrol secara sintaks yang dibuat oleh SynPG dapat digunakan untuk meningkatkan data untuk meningkatkan kepekatan model NLP.', 'de': 'Paraphrasengeneration spielt eine wesentliche Rolle im Natural Language Process (NLP), und es hat viele nachgelagerte Anwendungen. Das Training überwachter Paraphrasenmodelle erfordert jedoch viele annotierte Paraphrasenpaare, die in der Regel teuer zu erhalten sind. Andererseits sind die Paraphrasen, die durch bestehende unüberwachte Ansätze generiert werden, meist syntaktisch den Ausgangssätzen ähnlich und in ihrer Vielfalt begrenzt. In diesem Beitrag zeigen wir, dass es möglich ist, syntaktisch verschiedene Paraphrasen ohne annotierte Paraphrasenpaare zu generieren. Wir schlagen Syntaktisch gesteuerten Paraphrasen Generator (SynPG) vor, ein Encoder-Decoder-basiertes Modell, das lernt, die Semantik und die Syntax eines Satzes aus einer Sammlung von nicht notierten Texten zu entkoppeln. Die Entkoppelung ermöglicht es SynPG, die Syntax von Ausgabeparaphrasen durch Manipulation der Einbettung im Syntaktraum zu steuern. Umfangreiche Experimente mit automatischen Metriken und menschlicher Auswertung zeigen, dass SynPG eine bessere syntaktische Kontrolle als unbeaufsichtigte Baselines durchführt, während die Qualität der erzeugten Paraphrasen wettbewerbsfähig ist. Wir zeigen auch, dass SynPG wettbewerbsfähig oder sogar besser als überwachte Modelle ist, wenn die nicht notierten Daten groß sind. Abschließend zeigen wir, dass die syntaktisch gesteuerten Paraphrasen, die von SynPG generiert werden, für die Datenauswertung genutzt werden können, um die Robustheit von NLP-Modellen zu verbessern.', 'ko': '해석의 생성은 자연언어과정(NLP)에서 매우 중요한 역할을 하는데 많은 하류 응용이 있다.그러나 훈련 감독의 해석 모형은 주석이 달린 해석을 많이 필요로 하는데 이런 해석은 통상적인 대가가 높다.다른 한편, 기존의 무감독 방법이 만들어낸 해석은 문법적으로 원문과 비슷하고 다양성에 한계가 있다.본고에서 우리는 주석이 필요 없는 해석이 맞는 상황에서 문법적으로 다른 해석을 생성할 수 있음을 증명했다.우리는 문법 제어의 해석 생성기(SynPG)를 제시했다. 이것은 인코더-디코더를 기반으로 한 모델로 주석이 없는 텍스트에서 문장의 의미와 문법을 분리하는 것을 배울 수 있다.매듭을 풀면 SynPG는 구문 공간에 삽입된 구문을 조작하여 출력이 반복되는 구문을 제어할 수 있습니다.자동 도량과 인공 평가를 사용하여 진행된 대량의 실험에서 SynPG는 무감독 기선보다 문법 제어 능력이 좋고 생성된 해석의 질이 경쟁력이 있음을 나타냈다.또한 메모되지 않은 데이터가 많을 때 SynPG의 성능이 감독 모델보다 우수할 정도로 경쟁력이 있다는 것을 증명했습니다.마지막으로 우리는 SynPG가 생성한 문법 제어 해석이 데이터 확장에 사용되고 NLP모델의 노봉성을 높일 수 있음을 증명했다.', 'sw': 'Kizazi cha Paraphra kinacheza jukumu la muhimu katika mchakato wa lugha asili (NLP), na ina matumizi mengi ya mito ya chini. However, training supervised paraphrase models requires many annotated paraphrase pairs, which are usually costly to obtain.  Kwa upande mwingine, upande uliotengenezwa na mbinu zisizo na uhakika mara nyingi huwa zinafanana na sentensi za vyanzo na vingi vikubwa katika tofauti. Katika gazeti hili, tunaonyesha kwamba inawezekana kutengeneza misingi mbalimbali kwa pamoja bila haja ya wanandoa waliotajwa. Tunawapendekeza muundo wa kodi wa Paraphra uliothibitiwa kwa pamoja (SynPG), modeli inayohusika na kodi inayojifunza kuachana na mfumo wa hukumu kutoka kwenye mkusanyiko wa ujumbe usiotarajiwa. Kutokana na ugonjwa huu unawezesha SynPG kudhibiti syntax of output by manipuling the entry in the sync space. Majaribio mengi kwa kutumia mbinu za kujitegemea na tathmini za binadamu zinaonyesha kwamba SynPG hufanya udhibiti bora wa ushirikiano kuliko misingi isiyohifadhiwa, wakati ubora wa vipaji vilivyozaliwa ni ushindani. Pia tunaonyesha kwamba utendaji wa SynPG una ushindani au hata bora kuliko mifano inayofuatiliwa pale taarifa zisizoeleweka ni kubwa. Mwisho, tunaonyesha kuwa vipengele vilivyotengenezwa na SynPG vinaweza kutumika kwa ajili ya kuongeza data ili kuboresha ubaguzi wa mifano ya NLP.', 'bg': 'Генерирането на парафрази играе съществена роля в процеса на естествен език (НЛП) и има много приложения надолу по веригата. Обаче обучението на моделите на парафрази под надзор изисква много анотирани парафрази двойки, които обикновено са скъпи за получаване. От друга страна, парафразите, генерирани от съществуващи ненадзорни подходи, обикновено са синтактично подобни на изходните изречения и са ограничени в разнообразието. В тази статия демонстрираме, че е възможно синтактично да се генерират различни парафрази без необходимостта от анотирани парафразни двойки. Предлагаме синтактично контролиран генератор на парафрази (SynPG), базиран на кодер-декодер модел, който се научава да разглобява семантиката и синтаксиса на изречение от колекция от неописани текстове. Развързването позволява на SynPG да контролира синтаксиса на изходните парафрази чрез манипулиране на вграждането в синтактичното пространство. Обширни експерименти, използващи автоматични показатели и човешка оценка, показват, че изпълнява по-добър синтактичен контрол от необузданите базови линии, докато качеството на генерираните парафрази е конкурентно. Също така демонстрираме, че производителността на SynPG е конкурентна или дори по-добра от наблюдаваните модели, когато неописаните данни са големи. Накрая, показваме, че синтактично контролираните парафрази, генерирани от SynPG, могат да бъдат използвани за увеличаване на данните за подобряване на здравината на моделите на НЛП.', 'tr': "Parafraz döredişi tebigy dil prosesinde örän möhüm roli çalýar (NLP), we bunyň kän aşaky programleri bar. Ýöne gözleýän parafraz nusgalaryny öwrenmek üçin köp nusgalan parafraz çiftleri gerek. Diňe ýagdaýda, bar hem maslahat berilmeýän golaýlardan döredilen parafrazler köplenç çeşme sözleriň ýaly bir şekilde meňzeýär we näçe görnüşlerde çykarylýar. Bu kagyzda, sözleşen parafraz çiftleri bolmasynyň mümkin olduğunu gösterip bilýäris Biz Sintaktik denetimli Parafraz Generatörü (SynPG), kodlayıcı tabanlı bir modeli, semantikleri ve bilinmeyen metin koleksiyonundan sözlerini çykarmayı öwrendirdik. Beýik gabdalyk SinPG'i çikgin paraphrazleriniň sintaksis edip sintaktik seleňinde girişdirmek üçin mümkin edýär Otomatik metriýa we adamlaryň deňlenmesinden ullanýan ýagdaý deneyler SynPG suytlanmadyk baz hatlaryndan has gowy syntaktik kontrol edýändigini görkezýär, ýüklenen parafrazlerin keyfiýeti rekabetçidir. Biz hem SynPG'iň tanyşylygynyň döwletleri ýa-da tanyş edilmedik hatlaryň uly döwletlerinden has gowydygyny görkezilýäris. Soňunda, SynPG tarapyndan üretilen sintaktik kontrol eden parafrazleriň NLP modelleriniň ýigşirligini geliştirmek üçin ullanylabilir.", 'af': "Parafrase generasie speel 'n nuwe rol in natuurlike taal proses (NLP), en dit het baie onderstreem toepassings. Maar onderwerp van die onderwerp van die parafrase-modelles benodig baie aanmerkte parafrase paar, wat gewoonlik koste is om te kry. Op die ander kant is die parafrase genereer deur bestaande ongeondersteunde toegange gewoonlik sintaktisies gelyk aan die bron setnings en is beperk in diversiteit. In hierdie papier, ons wys dat dit moontlik is om sintaktisies verskillende parafrase te genereer sonder die nodig vir aanmerkte parafrase paar. Ons voorstel sintaktisies kontroleerde Parafrase Genereerder (SynPG), ' n enkoder- dekoder gebaseerde model wat leer om die semantieke en die sintaks van 'n seting uit 'n versameling van onbekende teks te verwerp. Die ontskakeling aktiveer Sintaks om die sintaks van uitset parafrase te beheer deur die inbêring in die sintaktis spasie te manipuleer. Ekstensiewe eksperimente gebruik outomatiese metries en menslike evaluering vertoon dat SynPG beter sintaksiese kontrole uitvoer as onverondersteunde basis lyne, terwyl die kwaliteit van die genereerde parafrase is kompetief. Ons wys ook dat die prestasie van SynPG rekenaar is of selfs beter as superviseerde modele wanneer die onbekende data groot is. Eindelik, ons wys dat die sintakteel kontroleerde parafrase wat deur SynPG genereer word kan gebruik word vir data augmentasie om die kragtigheid van NLP modelle te verbeter.", 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i parafrazave luan një rol thelbësor në procesin e gjuhës natyrore (NLP) dhe ka shumë aplikime në vazhdim. Megjithatë, trajnimi i modeleve parafraze të mbikqyrur kërkon shumë çifte parafraze të anotuara, të cilat zakonisht janë të shtrenjta për të marrë. Nga ana tjetër, parafrazat e gjeneruara nga qasjet ekzistuese të pazgjidhura janë zakonisht sintaktikisht të ngjashme me frazat e burimit dhe janë të kufizuara në diversitet. Në këtë letër, ne demonstrojmë se është e mundur të gjenerohen parafraza sintetikisht të ndryshme pa nevojën për çifte parafraza të anotuara. Ne propozojmë Gjeneratorin e Parafrazave të Kontrolluara Sintaktikisht (SynPG), një model bazuar në kodifikues-dekoder që mëson të heqë qafe semantikën dhe sintaksin e një fjalie nga një koleksion tekstesh të pa shënuar. Zhvendosja lejon SynPG të kontrollojë sintaksin e parafrazave të daljes duke manipuluar përfshirjen në hapësirën sintaktike. Eksperimentet e zgjeruara duke përdorur metrika automatike dhe vlerësimin njerëzor tregojnë se SynPG kryen kontrollin sintaktik më të mirë se linjat bazë të pazgjidhura, ndërsa cilësia e parafrazave të gjeneruara është konkurruese. Ne gjithashtu demonstrojmë se paraqitja e SynPG është konkurruese ose edhe më e mirë se modelet e mbikqyrura kur të dhënat e pa shënuar janë të mëdha. Më në fund, ne tregojmë se parafrazat e kontrolluara sintetikisht të gjeneruara nga SynPG mund të përdoren për rritjen e të dhënave për të përmirësuar fuqinë e modeleve NLP.', 'am': 'የፓራፍራሲ ትውልድ ፍጥረት ቋንቋ ፕሮጀክት (NLP) የሚያስፈልጋል፣ እናም ብዙ ፈሳሽ ፕሮግራሞች አሉ። ነገር ግን በተመለከተው የፓርላፊክራሲ ዓይነቶች ብዙዎችን የሚያስጨንቁባቸው የፋራሲ ሁለቶች ያስፈልጋሉ፤ እነዚህም አብዛኛውን ለማግኘት ዋጋዎች ናቸው፡፡ በሌላው በኩል፣ በተገኘው ያልጠበቀው ደረጃዎች የተደረገው መግለጫ በተለየ የኩነቶች ቃላት በተለየ ቁጥሮች በተለያዩ ናቸው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ እናሳየዋለን፣ በተለየ ሁኔታ የተለያየ የፊደል አካላትን ማፍጠር ይቻላል፡፡ የፋራሲ አቀማመጥ (SynPG)፣ የጽሑፎችን ጽሑፍ ማቀናቀል የሚያስተምረው የሆኑት የኮድዶዶር-መሠረት ሞዴል እና የፍርዱን ክፍል ማቀናቀል እና የደብዳቤ ጽሑፎችን ማቀናቀል እና ማስታወቂያውን እናደርጋለን፡፡ አውቶማቲክ የፖስቲካዊ ሜትሪክ እና የሰው ማስታወቂያ ሲንፕጂ ከተጠበቀው መደገፊያ ይልቅ የተሻለ የSyntactic kontroll ያደርጋል፡፡ እናም የሲንፕጂ አካባቢ ዳታዎች ብዛት ካልሆነው ከሞላት የበለጠ እንደሆነ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በመጨረሻውም በSynPG የተደረገው የዳታ አካባቢ ማድረግ የNLP ዓይነቶች ንብረት ማሻሻል የሚቻለውን የሲንተርካዊ ተቃራፊዎችን እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'az': "Parafraz nəzəriyyəti təbiətli dil prosesi (NLP) içində mövcud bir rol oynayır və çox düşük proqramlar vardır. Lakin təhsil edilmiş parafraz modellərinin çox nöqtəsizli parafraz çift olması lazımdır. Digər tərəfindən, mevcut müəyyən edilməmiş tərzlərin yaratdığı parafrazlar genellikle mənbə cümlələrinin sintaktik olaraq bənzəyir və müxtəlif cümlələrdə sınırlanır. Bu kağızda, sintaktik olaraq müxtəlif parafrazlər yaratmaq mümkün olduğunu göstəririk. Biz Sintaktik müdafiə edilmiş Parafraz Generator (SynPG), kodlayıcı-dekoder tabanlı modeli təklif edirik ki, semantik və sintaksini tanımadıqları məktub koleksiyonundan çəkindirmək öyrənir. Çıqış parafrazlərinin sintaksini sintaktik alanda işlədikləri üçün SynPG'nin sintaksini kontrol edər. Avtomatik metrikləri və insan değerlendirməsini istifadə edən çox uzaq eksperimentlər SynPG'nin daha yaxşı sintaktik kontrolünü müəyyən edilməmiş səhifələrdən daha yaxşı işlədiyini göstərər, yaratdığı parafrazlərin keyfiyyəti müqayisədir. Biz də göstəririk ki, SynPG performansı müqayisədə və ya çox gözlənmiş modellərdən daha yaxşıdır. Sonunda, SynPG tarafından yaratdığı sintaktik kontrol parafrazlərin NLP modellərinin gücünü artırmaq üçün məlumatları artırmaq üçün istifadə edilə bilər.", 'hy': "Փարաֆրեսի ստեղծման կարևոր դեր է խաղում բնական լեզվի գործընթացում (ՆԼՊ), և այն ունի շատ հետագա ծրագրեր: Այնուամենայնիվ, վերահսկված պարաֆրեզի մոդելները սովորաբար թանկ են ստանալու շատ գրված պարաֆրեզի զույգեր: Մյուս կողմից, գոյություն ունեցող անվերահսկված մոտեցումների միջոցով ստեղծված պարաֆրեզները սովորաբար սինտակտիկապես նման են աղբյուր նախադասություններին և սահմանափակված են բազմազանության մեջ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ հնարավոր է ստեղծել սինտակտիկ տարբեր պարաֆրեզներ առանց նշումնավորված պարաֆրեզների զույգերի կարիքի: Մենք առաջարկում ենք Սինտակտիկ կառավարվող պարաֆրեսի գեներատոր (ՍինԳԳ), մի կոդեր-կոդեր հիմնված մոդել, որը սովորում է բաժանել սեմանտիկան և նախադասության սինտաքսը աննոտացված տեքստների հավաքածուց: Բացակշռումը թույլ է տալիս ՍինգԳ-ին կառավարել արտադրյալ պարաֆրեսի սինտաքսը' կառավարելով ներգրավումը սինտակտիկ տարածքում: Օգտագործելով ավտոմատիկ մետրիկա և մարդկային գնահատման մեծ փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ ՍինԳԳ-ը ավելի լավ սինտակտիկ կառավարում է, քան անվերահսկված հիմնական գծերը, մինչդեռ ստեղծված պարաֆրեզների որակը մրցակցում Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ՍինԳԳ-ի արտադրողությունը մրցակցություն է, կամ նույնիսկ ավելի լավ է, քան վերահսկված մոդելները, երբ աննկարագրված տվյալները մեծ են: Վերջապես, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ սինտակտիկապես կառավարվող պարաֆրեզները, որոնք ստեղծվել են ՍինգԳ-ի կողմից, կարող են օգտագործվել տվյալների աճի համար, որպեսզի բարելավեն ՆԼՊ մոդելների կայունությունը:", 'bs': 'Generacija parafraza igra ključnu ulogu u procesu prirodnog jezika (NLP), i ima mnogo nužnih aplikacija. Međutim, modeli parafraze koji su nadzirani za obuku zahtijevaju mnoge annotirane parove parafraze, koje su obično skupe za dobivanje. Sa druge strane, parafraze koje su proizvedene postojećim neodređenim pristupima obično su sintaktično slične izvornim rečenicama i ograničene u raznolikosti. U ovom papiru pokazujemo da je moguće stvoriti sintaktički različite parafraze bez potrebe za annotiranim parovima parafraze. Predlažemo sintaktički kontrolirani Generator parafraze (SynPG), model bazirani na koderu i dekoderu koji nauči da uključuje semantiku i sintaks rečenice iz kolekcije neoznačenih tekstova. Desentacija omogućava SynPG da kontrolira sintaks izlaznih parafraza manipulirajući uključenje u sintaktički prostor. Eksperimenti koji koriste automatsku metriku i ljudsku procjenu pokazuju da SynPG izvodi bolju sintaktičku kontrolu od neodređenih početnih linija, dok je kvalitet proizvođenih parafraza konkurentna. Također pokazujemo da je učinkovito SynPG konkurentno ili čak bolje od nadzornih modela kada su neobični podaci veliki. Konačno, pokazujemo da sintaktički kontrolirane parafraze koje je stvorio SynPG mogu biti korištene za povećanje podataka kako bi poboljšali robotu NLP modela.', 'fa': 'نسل پارافریز نقش اصلی در فرایند زبان طبیعی (NLP) بازی می\u200cکند و کاربردهای زیادی پایین\u200cترین دارد. ولی آموزش مدل\u200cهای پارافریز تحت نظر قرار گرفته نیاز به جفت\u200cهای پارافریز\u200cهای زیادی است که معمولا برای دریافت ارزشمند. از طرف دیگر، پارافراز\u200cها که توسط دسترسی\u200cهای غیرقابل تحقیق شده\u200cاند معمولاً شبیه به جمله\u200cهای منبع هستند و در مختلف محدود می\u200cشوند. در این کاغذ، ما نشان می دهیم که ممکن است از طریق ساده\u200cهای متفاوتی بدون نیازی برای جفت\u200cهای پارافراژ\u200cها تولید کنیم. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که تولید کننده\u200cی پارافریز\u200cهای سنتاکتیکی کنترل شده (SynPG) یک مدل بنیاد\u200cهای رمز\u200cکننده\u200cی رمز\u200cکننده\u200cی رمز\u200cکننده\u200cای که یاد می\u200cگیرد که سنتاکتیک\u200cها و سنتاکس\u200cهای جمله\u200cای از جمع\u200cآوری متن\u200cهای غیر شناخته\u200c تغییر تغییر تغییر اجازه می\u200cدهد SynPG را برای کنترل ویژه\u200cسازی پارافریز\u200cهای خروجی با تغییر تغییر\u200cسازی در فضای ویژه\u200cسازی کنترل کند. آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده با استفاده از متریک\u200cهای خودکار و ارزیابی انسان نشان می\u200cدهد که SynPG کنترل\u200cهای سنتاکتیک بهتر از خط\u200cهای پایین\u200cهای پایین\u200cهای ناپذیر انجام می\u200cدهد، در حالی که کیفیت پارافراز\u200cهای تولید شده رقابت\u200cکنند ما همچنین نشان می دهیم که عملکرد SynPG رقابت کننده یا حتی بهتر از مدل های نظارت شده وقتی داده های غیر شناخته بزرگ است. بالاخره، نشان می دهیم که پارافراز\u200cهای سنتاکتیک کنترل شده توسط SynPG می\u200cتوانند برای افزایش داده\u200cها برای افزایش قوی مدل NLP استفاده کنند.', 'et': 'Parafraaside genereerimisel on looduskeele protsessis oluline roll ja sellel on palju alljärgnevaid rakendusi. Kuid koolituse järelevalve järelevalvega parafraasimudelid nõuavad paljusid märgitud parafraasipaare, mille hankimine on tavaliselt kulukas. Teisest küljest on olemasolevate järelevalveta lähenemisviiside põhjal loodud parafraasid tavaliselt süntaktiliselt sarnased lähtelausetega ja nende mitmekesisus on piiratud. Käesolevas töös näitame, et on võimalik genereerida süntaktiliselt erinevaid parafraase ilma vajaduseta märgitud parafraasi paare. Pakume välja süntaktiliselt kontrollitud parafraasigeneraatori (SynPG), kodeerija-dekoodri põhineva mudeli, mis õpib lahti siduma lause semantikat ja süntaksit märkimata tekstide kogumist. Lahutamine võimaldab SynPG kontrollida väljundparafraaside süntaksit manipuleerides manustamist süntaktilises ruumis. Laiaulatuslikud katsed automaatsete mõõdikute ja inimeste hindamisega näitavad, et SynPG suudab paremini süntaktilist kontrolli kui järelevalveta lähtejooned, samas kui genereeritud parafraaside kvaliteet on konkurentsivõimeline. Samuti näitame, et SynPG jõudlus on konkurentsivõimeline või isegi parem kui järelevalvemudelid, kui märkimata andmed on suured. Lõpuks näitame, et SynPG genereeritud süntaktiliselt kontrollitud parafraase saab kasutada andmete suurendamiseks, et parandada NLP mudelite tugevust.', 'fi': 'Parafraasien generointi on olennainen osa luonnollisen kielen prosessia (NLP), ja sillä on monia jatkojalostuksen sovelluksia. Koulutuksessa valvotut parafraasimallit edellyttävät kuitenkin monia annotoituja parafraasipareja, joiden hankkiminen on yleensä kallista. Toisaalta olemassa olevien valvomattomien lähestymistapojen luomat parafraasit ovat yleensä syntaktisesti samanlaisia kuin lähdelauseet ja moninaisuudeltaan rajallisia. Tässä artikkelissa osoitetaan, että on mahdollista luoda syntaktisesti erilaisia parafraaseja ilman huomautuksia parafraasepareja. Ehdotamme Syntaktisesti ohjattua parafraasigeneraattoria (SynPG), kooderi-dekooderipohjaista mallia, joka oppii purkamaan lauseen semantiikan ja syntaksin merkitsemättömien tekstien kokoelmasta. Irrotamisen avulla SynPG voi hallita lähtöparafraasien syntaksia manipuloimalla upotusta syntaktiseen tilaan. Laajat automaattisia mittareita ja ihmisen arviointia hyödyntävät kokeet osoittavat, että SynPG:llä on parempi syntaktinen kontrolli kuin valvomattomilla lähtölinjoilla, kun taas luotujen parafraasien laatu on kilpailukykyinen. Osoitamme myös, että SynPG:n suorituskyky on kilpailukykyinen tai jopa parempi kuin valvotut mallit, kun merkitsemätön data on suuri. Lopuksi osoitamme, että SynPG:n tuottamia syntaktisesti kontrolloituja parafraaseja voidaan hyödyntää datan lisäämiseen NLP-mallien kestävyyden parantamiseksi.', 'ca': "La generació de parafrases té un paper essencial en el procés de llenguatge natural (NLP) i té moltes aplicacions avall. No obstant això, els models de parafrases supervisionats requereixen molts parells de parafrases anotats, que normalment són costosos per obtenir. D'altra banda, les parafrases generades pels enfocaments no supervisats existents són normalment sinàcticament similars a les frases d'origen i són limitades en la diversitat. En aquest article demostrem que és possible generar parafrases sinàcticament diverses sense la necessitat de parells de parafrases anotats. Proposem un generador de parafrases controlat sintàticament (SynPG), un model basat en codificador-decoder que aprenen a desmantellar la semàntica i la sintaxi d'una frase d'una col·lecció de textos no notats. La desintegració permet a SynPG controlar la sintaxi de parafrases de sortida manipulant l'incorporació a l'espai sinàctic. Els extensos experiments que utilitzen mètriques automàtiques i l'evaluació humana demostren que SynPG té un control sinàctic millor que les línies de base no supervisades, mentre que la qualitat de les parafrases generades és competitiva. També demostrem que el rendiment de SynPG és competitiu o fins i tot millor que els models supervisats quan les dades no notades són grans. Finalment, demostram que les parafrases sinàcticament controlades generades per SynPG es poden utilitzar per augmentar les dades per millorar la robustet dels models NLP.", 'bn': 'প্যারাফ্রাজ প্রজন্ম প্রাকৃতিক ভাষায় গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভূমিকা প্রদর্শন করেছে (এনএলপি) এবং এর অনেক নিচের প্রোগ্রা তবে প্রশিক্ষণ পর্যবেক্ষণ করা প্যারাফ্রেস মডেল অনেক বিরক্তিকর প্যারাফ্রেস জোড়ার প্রয়োজন, যা সাধারণত অর্জনের জন্য দাম। অন্যদিকে, বিদ্যমান অরক্ষিত পদ্ধতি দ্বারা তৈরি করা প্যারাফেরাগুলো সাধারণত উৎসের শাস্তির সাথে সাধারণত সংক্রান্ত এবং বৈচিত এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রমাণ করি যে এটি সাধারণ বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন প্যারাফ্রেক্স তৈরি করতে পারে কোন প্যারাফ্রেস জোড়ার প্রয়োজন না  আমরা সিন্ট্যাকটিক্যালিকভাবে নিয়ন্ত্রণ করা প্যারাফ্রাজ জ জেনারেটর (সিনিপিজি), একটি এনকোডার-ডেকোডার ভিত্তিক মডেল, যা শিখতে পারে সেমেন্টিক্স এবং অজা সিন্ট্যাক্টিক স্পেসে প্রবেশ করার মাধ্যমে আউটপুট প্যারাফ্রেক্সের সিন্ট্যাক্স নিয়ন্ত্রণ করতে সিনিপিজি সক্রিয় করে। স্বয়ংক্রিয় মেট্রিক এবং মানুষের মূল্য ব্যবহার করে বিশাল পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে সিনিপিজি অরক্ষিত বেসারেশনের চেয়ে ভালো সিন্ট্যাকটিক নিয়ন্ত্রণ আমরা একই সাথে দেখাচ্ছি যে সিনিপিজির প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিযোগিতা বা এমনকি পর্যবেক্ষিত মডেলের চেয়ে ভালো কিংবা অন্যান্য শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে সিনিপিজি তৈরি করা প্যারাফ্রেস সংক্রান্ত নিয়ন্ত্রণ করা হয়েছে তা এনএলপি মডেলের রোবস্টের উন্নতি করার জন্য ডা', 'cs': 'Generace parafrází hraje zásadní roli v procesu přirozeného jazyka (NLP) a má mnoho následných aplikací. Nicméně, trénink modelů pod dohledem parafráze vyžaduje mnoho anotovaných parafrázových párů, které jsou obvykle nákladné na získání. Na druhou stranu parafráze generované existujícími přístupy bez dohledu jsou obvykle syntakticky podobné zdrojovým větám a jsou omezené rozmanitostí. V tomto článku ukazujeme, že je možné syntakticky různé parafráze generovat bez nutnosti anotovaných parafrázových párů. Navrhujeme syntakticky řízený parafrázový generátor (SynPG), model založený na kodéru a dekodéru, který se naučí oddělit sémantiku a syntaxi věty ze sbírky nezapsaných textů. Rozdělení umožňuje SynPG řídit syntaxi výstupních parafrází manipulací s vložením do syntaktického prostoru. Rozsáhlé experimenty s využitím automatických metrik a lidského vyhodnocení ukazují, že SynPG provádí lepší syntaktickou kontrolu než bez dozoru základní linie, zatímco kvalita generovaných parafrází je konkurenceschopná. Dokazujeme také, že výkon SynPG je konkurenceschopný nebo dokonce lepší než monitorované modely, když jsou nezapsaná data velká. Nakonec ukazujeme, že syntakticky řízené parafráze generované SynPG lze využít pro rozšíření dat ke zlepšení robustnosti NLP modelů.', 'jv': 'Global Nanging, kudu langkung urip-urip model sing dadi pasarasan sing nyatakake Nang alih-alih, paraFrasé sing gagalé karo perusahaan sing gak bener Nang pemilih iki, kita ngomongke tindong iso nggawe seneng pisan-pakan banget nggawe Awakdhéwé ngergunaké Senaksi nguasakno ParaFrase Genertor (sinaAlgi), model sing basa ditambah karo koder Ngubah Name Awak dhéwé éntuk ngerasakno ngono hal nyanggakuné Singg sampek karo model sing luwih apik, sampek sing luwih apik karo model sing gawe nguasai data sing ora biretekno. Eremungno, kita ngomongke simbol punika diperawat sing wis nguasai seneng diperawat sing gagewak seneng sinaksi iso nggawe nggo sistem dadi ampungasun kanggo ngerasakno akeh sistem kaha model NLP.', 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje parafraz igra bistveno vlogo v procesu naravnega jezika (NLP) in ima številne nadaljnje aplikacije. Vendar pa za usposabljanje nadzorovanih parafraznih modelov potrebujejo številne označene parafrazne pare, ki jih je običajno drago pridobiti. Po drugi strani so parafraze, ki jih ustvarjajo obstoječi nenadzorovani pristopi, običajno sintaktično podobne izvornim stavkom in so omejene v raznolikosti. V tem prispevku dokazujemo, da je mogoče ustvariti sintaktično različne parafraze brez potrebe po označenih parafraznih parov. Predlagamo Sintaktično nadzorovani generator parafraze (SynPG), model, ki temelji na kodirniku-dekodirju, ki se nauči ločiti semantiko in sintakso stavka iz zbirke neopisovanih besedil. Razvezanost omogoča SynPG nadzor sintakse izhodnih parafraz z manipulacijo vdelave v sintaktični prostor. Obsežni poskusi z uporabo avtomatskih meritev in človeškega ocenjevanja kažejo, da SynPG izvaja boljši sintaktični nadzor kot neobzorovane osnovne linije, medtem ko je kakovost ustvarjenih parafraz konkurenčna. Dokazujemo tudi, da je zmogljivost SynPG konkurenčna ali celo boljša od nadzorovanih modelov, kadar so neobvezani podatki veliki. Nazadnje smo pokazali, da je sintaktično nadzorovane parafraze, ki jih ustvari SynPG, mogoče uporabiti za povečanje podatkov za izboljšanje robustnosti modelov NLP.', 'ha': "Kijan Parafrase yana da wani roli na muhimu a cikin jarraba harshen kwance (NLP), kuma yana da wasu shiryoyin ayuka masu ƙarƙashin da ke ƙarƙashin. However, training supervised paraphrase models requires many annotated paraphrase pairs, which are usually costly to obtain.  Ga da wani gefen, parameters wanda aka ƙãga da hanyõyin da ba'a tsare su ba na da shi na zaman a sami daidai da maganar source kuma ana ƙayyade cikin dabam-dabam. Ga wannan takardan, Munã nuna cewa za'a iya ƙiƙiro parameteri masu daidaita kuma bã da wani haji ga mutane da aka faɗa. Tuna goyyar da shirin Kizaɓen Parafrase (SinPG), wata motel na kode-kode wanda yana iya yin amfani da yin cire-kafin na-sakan sigarin da aka samu wani rubutun da ba'a sani ba. @ info: whatsthis Cire masu ƙaranci da ake amfani da amfani da amfani da metrics farat ɗaya da kima yana nuna cewa, synPG na aikata mafi alhẽri na hanyor syntactic ko da ba'a tsare, kuma tsarin parameters da aka ƙãga shi yana mai competiti. Tune nuna cewa cikakken SinPG yana da tsohon ko ko mafi alhẽri daga misalin da aka tsare idan data na da ba'a sani ya girma. Ga ƙarshe, Munã nũna cewa parameters da aka yi hanyarwa da synPG, ana iya amfani da shi dõmin a ƙara data dõmin ya kyautata ustawi wa misãlai na NLP.", 'bo': 'Paraphrase generation plays an essential role in natural language process (NLP)and it has many downstream applications. ཡིན་ནའང་། ལྟ་བུའི་གནད་སྡུད་དམ་འཛུགས་པའི་མིག་ལམ་ལུགས་དགོས་པ་ཡིན་ན། ཕྱོགས་གཞན་ཞིག་ནས་གནས་ཡུལ་མེད་པའི་བཟོ་ཚིག་གཟུགས་རིས་འདི་དག་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ནི་ཐོག་མའི་ཚིག འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་ཚིག་རྟགས་མི་འདྲ་བ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་Syntactically controlled Paraphrase Generator The disentanglement enables SynPG to control the syntax of output paraphrases by manipulating the embedding in the syntactic space. Extensive experiments using automatic metrics and human evaluation show that SynPG performs better syntactic control than unsupervised baselines, while the quality of the generated paraphrases is competitive. ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་SynPG ཡི་བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་འདི་སྒྲུབ་ཅན་གྱི་མ་དཔེ་གཞིའི་ཆེ་ཆུང་མེད་པའི་སྒེར་སྤྱོད་དང་། མཐའ་མར་དུ། ང་ཚོས་SynPG(རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་དབུས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བའི་གཟུགས་རིས་ཚིག་དག་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ', 'he': "דור פראפרזים משחק תפקיד חיוני בתהליך השפה הטבעית (NLP), ויש לו הרבה שימושים מתקדמים. עם זאת, דוגמנים של פראפרזיה שמבוטחים על אימון דורשים זוגות פראפרזיות רבות שמוצאות על הערות, שבדרך כלל יקרים להשיג. מצד שני, הפרמיזות שנוצרות על ידי גישות לא משגיחות קיימות בדרך כלל דומות באופן סינטקטי למשפטי המקור והן מוגבלות בגוון. בעיתון הזה, אנו מראים שאפשר ליצור מופרסים שונים באופן סינטקטי ללא הצורך לזוגות מופרסים. אנו מציעים גינרטור פראפרזיה (SynPG) בשליטה סינטקטית, מודל מבוסס על קודד-קידור שמלמד לפרוק את הסמנטיקה והסינטקס של משפט מאסף טקסטים ללא ניתוח. הפרידה מאפשרת לסינגנג' לשלוט בסינטקס של פראפרסמות יציאה על ידי מניפולציה של ההכניסה בחלל הסינטקטי. ניסויים רחבים בשימוש במטריקה אוטומטית והערכה האנושית מראים שSynPG מבצע שליטה סינטקטית טובה יותר מאשר קווי הבסיס ללא השגחה, בעוד איכות הפרפרסמות הנוצרות היא תחרותית. אנחנו גם מראים שהביצועים של SynPG הם תחרותיים או אפילו טובים יותר מאשר מודלים מבוקשים כאשר הנתונים הלא רשומים הם גדולים. Finally, we show that the syntactically controlled paraphrases generated by SynPG can be utilized for data augmentation to improve the robustness of NLP models."}
{'en': 'Data Augmentation for Hypernymy Detection', 'ar': 'زيادة البيانات لاكتشاف Hypernymy', 'pt': 'Aumento de dados para detecção de hipernímia', 'fr': "Augmentation des données pour la détection de l'hypernymie", 'es': 'Aumento de datos para la detección de hipernemia', 'ja': 'ハイパーニミー検出のためのデータ拡張', 'hi': 'Hypernymy डिटेक्शन के लिए डेटा वृद्धि', 'ru': 'Расширение данных для обнаружения гипернимии', 'zh': '以超音检数增强', 'ga': 'Méadú Sonraí le haghaidh Aimsithe Hipirimide', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Adatbővítés hipernímia felismeréséhez', 'it': 'Aumento dei dati per il rilevamento di ipernimia', 'el': 'Αύξηση δεδομένων για την ανίχνευση υπερνυμίας', 'kk': 'Hypernymy анықтау үшін деректерді көтеру', 'ms': 'Pembesaran Data untuk Pengesanan Hipernimi', 'mk': 'Агментација на податоците за детекција на хипернимија', 'ml': 'ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dന്നി ഡേറ്റാ ഓഗ്മെന്റേഷന്\u200d', 'mn': 'Hypernymy Detection-ын өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэлт', 'no': 'Data- augmentasjon for hypernymoppdaging', 'pl': 'Rozszerzenie danych dla wykrywania hipernimii', 'mt': 'Żieda fid-Dejta għad-Detezzjoni ta’ Ipernimja', 'ro': 'Augmentarea datelor pentru detectarea hipernimii', 'so': 'Data Augmentation for Hypernymy Detection', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'Hypernymy கண்டுபிடிப்புக்கான தரவு கூறுதல்', 'sv': 'Dataförstärkning för detektering av hypernymi', 'ur': 'Hypernymy Detection کے لئے ڈاٹا اگنٹمنٹ', 'sr': 'Povećanje podataka za detekciju hipernimi', 'lt': 'Duomenų padidėjimas hipernimijos nustatymui', 'uz': 'Data Augmentation for Hypernymy Detection', 'vi': 'Tăng dữ liệu cho trinh sát Hypernymy', 'bg': 'Увеличаване на данни за откриване на хипернимия', 'da': 'Dataudvidelse til detektion af hypernymi', 'nl': 'Data Augmentation voor hyperniemiedetectie', 'hr': 'Povećanje podataka za hipernimu', 'de': 'Datenerweiterung für die Erkennung von Hypernymien', 'ko': '초동명 검출에 사용되는 데이터 확장', 'fa': 'افزایش داده برای شناسایی هوپر نیمی', 'id': 'Augmentasi Data untuk Deteksi Hipernimi', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Tamko la taarifa kwa Kuchunguza Hypernymy', 'tr': 'Hipernimi Taýşartmak üçin Maglumat Aýagdasy', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Data Augmentation for Hypernymy Detection', 'ca': 'Data Augmentation for Hypernymy Detection', 'az': 'Hypernimik keşfinin məlumatları artırması', 'bn': 'Hypernymy Detection জন্য ডাটা অ্যাগ- মেন্টেশন', 'bs': 'Povećanje podataka za detekciju hipernimi', 'cs': 'Rozšíření dat pro detekci hypernymií', 'et': 'Andmete suurendamine hüpernüümia tuvastamiseks', 'fi': 'Tietojen lisääminen hypernyymin havaitsemista varten', 'sq': 'Rritja e të dhënave për zbulimin e hipernimisë', 'jv': 'AllProgressBar', 'sk': 'Povečanje podatkov za zaznavanje hipernimije', 'he': 'גידול נתונים לגלות היפרנימיה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Hypernymy Detection་ལ་སྡུད་བཙལ་བཞག་པ'}
{'en': 'The automatic detection of hypernymy relationships represents a challenging problem in NLP. The successful application of state-of-the-art supervised approaches using distributed representations has generally been impeded by the limited availability of high quality training data. We have developed two novel data augmentation techniques which generate new training examples from existing ones. First, we combine the linguistic principles of hypernym transitivity and intersective modifier-noun composition to generate additional pairs of vectors, such as small dog-dog or small dog-animal, for which a hypernymy relationship can be assumed. Second, we use generative adversarial networks (GANs) to generate pairs of vectors for which the hypernymy relation can also be assumed. We furthermore present two complementary strategies for extending an existing dataset by leveraging linguistic resources such as WordNet. Using an evaluation across 3 different datasets for hypernymy detection and 2 different vector spaces, we demonstrate that both of the proposed automatic data augmentation and dataset extension strategies substantially improve classifier performance.', 'ar': 'يمثل الاكتشاف التلقائي لعلاقات hypernymy مشكلة صعبة في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. التطبيق الناجح لأحدث الأساليب الخاضعة للإشراف باستخدام التمثيلات الموزعة قد أعيق عمومًا بسبب التوافر المحدود لبيانات التدريب عالية الجودة. لقد قمنا بتطوير تقنيتين جديدتين لزيادة البيانات والتي تولد أمثلة تدريبية جديدة من الأمثلة الموجودة. أولاً ، نقوم بدمج المبادئ اللغوية لعبور hypernym والتركيب المُعدِّل للأسماء المتداخلة لتوليد أزواج إضافية من المتجهات ، مثل "كلب صغير - كلب" أو "كلب صغير - حيوان" ، والتي يمكن افتراض وجود علاقة فرط فيها. ثانيًا ، نستخدم شبكات الخصومة التوليدية (GANs) لتوليد أزواج من النواقل التي يمكن أيضًا افتراض علاقة التشعب بها. علاوة على ذلك ، نقدم استراتيجيتين تكميليتين لتوسيع مجموعة بيانات موجودة من خلال الاستفادة من الموارد اللغوية مثل WordNet. باستخدام تقييم عبر 3 مجموعات بيانات مختلفة للكشف عن فرط الحركة ومسافتين متجهتين مختلفتين ، أوضحنا أن كلا من زيادة البيانات التلقائية المقترحة واستراتيجيات تمديد مجموعة البيانات تحسن أداء المصنف بشكل كبير.', 'pt': 'A detecção automática de relacionamentos de hipernímia representa um problema desafiador em PNL. A aplicação bem-sucedida de abordagens supervisionadas de última geração usando representações distribuídas geralmente tem sido impedida pela disponibilidade limitada de dados de treinamento de alta qualidade. Desenvolvemos duas novas técnicas de aumento de dados que geram novos exemplos de treinamento a partir dos existentes. Primeiro, combinamos os princípios linguísticos da transitividade hipernímica e da composição intersectiva modificador-substantivo para gerar pares adicionais de vetores, como “cachorro-cachorro” ou “cachorro-cachorro-animal”, para os quais uma relação de hipernímia pode ser assumida. Em segundo lugar, usamos redes adversariais generativas (GANs) para gerar pares de vetores para os quais a relação de hipernímia também pode ser assumida. Além disso, apresentamos duas estratégias complementares para estender um conjunto de dados existente, aproveitando recursos linguísticos como o WordNet. Usando uma avaliação em 3 conjuntos de dados diferentes para detecção de hipernímia e 2 espaços vetoriais diferentes, demonstramos que tanto o aumento automático de dados proposto quanto as estratégias de extensão do conjunto de dados melhoram substancialmente o desempenho do classificador.', 'es': 'La detección automática de las relaciones de hipernemia representa un problema desafiante en la PNL. La aplicación exitosa de enfoques supervisados de última generación que utilizan representaciones distribuidas generalmente se ha visto obstaculizada por la disponibilidad limitada de datos de capacitación de alta calidad. Hemos desarrollado dos técnicas novedosas de aumento de datos que generan nuevos ejemplos de entrenamiento a partir de los existentes. Primero, combinamos los principios lingüísticos de la transitividad del hipernónimo y la composición del modificador intersectivo y el sustantivo para generar pares adicionales de vectores, como «perro pequeño - perro» o «perro pequeño - animal», para los que se puede suponer una relación hipernímica. En segundo lugar, utilizamos redes generativas adversarias (GAN) para generar pares de vectores para los que también se puede asumir la relación de hipernemia. Además, presentamos dos estrategias complementarias para ampliar un conjunto de datos existente mediante el aprovechamiento de recursos lingüísticos como WordNet. Mediante una evaluación de 3 conjuntos de datos diferentes para la detección de hipernemias y 2 espacios vectoriales diferentes, demostramos que tanto las estrategias propuestas de ampliación automática de datos como de extensión de conjuntos de datos mejoran sustancialmente el rendimiento del clasificador.', 'fr': "La détection automatique des relations d'hypernymie représente un problème difficile en PNL. L'application réussie d'approches supervisées de pointe utilisant des représentations distribuées a généralement été entravée par la disponibilité limitée de données de formation de haute qualité. Nous avons développé deux nouvelles techniques d'augmentation de données qui génèrent de nouveaux exemples d'entraînement à partir de ceux qui existent déjà. Tout d'abord, nous combinons les principes linguistiques de transitivité hypernymique et de composition modificateur-nom intersective pour générer des paires supplémentaires de vecteurs, tels que «\xa0petit chien - chien\xa0» ou «\xa0petit chien - animal\xa0», pour lesquels une relation hypernymie peut être supposée. Ensuite, nous utilisons des réseaux antagonistes génératifs (GAN) pour générer des paires de vecteurs pour lesquels la relation d'hypernymie peut également être supposée. Nous présentons également deux stratégies complémentaires pour étendre un ensemble de données existant en tirant parti de ressources linguistiques telles que WordNet. En utilisant une évaluation de 3 ensembles de données différents pour la détection de l'hypernymie et de 2 espaces vectoriels différents, nous démontrons que les stratégies d'augmentation automatique de données et d'extension de jeu de données proposées améliorent considérablement les performances du classificateur.", 'ja': 'ハイパーニミー関係の自動検出は、NLPにおける困難な問題を表します。 分散表現を使用した最先端の監督下アプローチの成功は、高品質のトレーニングデータの利用可能性が限られていることによって一般的に妨げられている。 私たちは、既存のトレーニング例から新しいトレーニング例を生成する2つの新しいデータ拡張技術を開発しました。 第一に、我々は、ハイパーニームの遷移性と交差修飾語-名詞の構成の言語学的原理を組み合わせて、「小さな犬-犬」または「小さな犬-動物」などの追加のベクターの対を生成し、そのためにハイパーニミー関係を仮定することができる。 第２に、生成対抗ネットワーク（ ＧＡＮ ）を使用して、ハイパーニミー関係を仮定することもできるベクトルのペアを生成する。 さらに、WordNetなどの言語リソースを活用して、既存のデータセットを拡張するための2つの相補的な戦略を提示します。 ハイパーニミー検出のための3つの異なるデータセットと2つの異なるベクトル空間にわたる評価を使用して、我々は、提案された自動データ拡張とデータセット拡張戦略の両方が分類子のパフォーマンスを実質的に改善することを実証します。', 'hi': 'Hypernymy संबंधों का स्वत: पता लगाना NLP में एक चुनौतीपूर्ण समस्या का प्रतिनिधित्व करता है। वितरित अभ्यावेदन का उपयोग करके अत्याधुनिक पर्यवेक्षित दृष्टिकोणों के सफल अनुप्रयोग को आम तौर पर उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले प्रशिक्षण डेटा की सीमित उपलब्धता से बाधित किया गया है। हमने दो उपन्यास डेटा संवर्धन तकनीकों को विकसित किया है जो मौजूदा लोगों से नए प्रशिक्षण उदाहरण उत्पन्न करते हैं। सबसे पहले, हम हाइपरनिम ट्रांजिटिविटी और इंटरसेकेटिव संशोधक-संज्ञा संरचना के भाषाई सिद्धांतों को जोड़ते हैं ताकि वैक्टर के अतिरिक्त जोड़े उत्पन्न किए जा सकें, जैसे कि "छोटा कुत्ता - कुत्ता" या "छोटा कुत्ता - जानवर", जिसके लिए एक हाइपरनिमी संबंध माना जा सकता है। दूसरा, हम वैक्टर के जोड़े उत्पन्न करने के लिए उत्पादक प्रतिकूल नेटवर्क (जीएएन) का उपयोग करते हैं, जिसके लिए हाइपरनिमी संबंध भी माना जा सकता है। हम इसके अलावा WordNet जैसे भाषाई संसाधनों का लाभ उठाकर मौजूदा डेटासेट का विस्तार करने के लिए दो पूरक रणनीतियों को प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हाइपरनॉमी डिटेक्शन और 2 अलग-अलग वेक्टर रिक्त स्थान के लिए 3 अलग-अलग डेटासेट में मूल्यांकन का उपयोग करते हुए, हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि प्रस्तावित स्वचालित डेटा वृद्धि और डेटासेट एक्सटेंशन रणनीतियों दोनों ने क्लासिफायर प्रदर्शन में काफी सुधार किया है।', 'zh': '超性关系自动检测者,NLP之挑战性也。 用分布式最先进监督之法,宜用常高质量训练有限可用性阻。 吾开二术,可以成示例。 先合超义词传递性间移词修饰词-名词之语言学理,以成额外之向量,如小狗 - 狗,或小狗 - 物,可假超音符。 其次,以生成抗网络(GAN)生向量对,亦可假设非常。 又建二互补之策,以广WordNet数集。 以3异数集之评,与2异向量之间,证其自强,广其方略,大大提高其类也。', 'ru': 'Автоматическое обнаружение гипернимических отношений представляет собой сложную проблему в NLP. Успешному применению современных контролируемых подходов с использованием распределенных представлений, как правило, препятствует ограниченное наличие высококачественных данных о подготовке кадров. Мы разработали две новые методики расширения данных, которые генерируют новые учебные примеры из существующих. Во-первых, мы объединяем лингвистические принципы транзитивности гипернима и межлингвистического состава «модификатор - существительное», чтобы генерировать дополнительные пары векторов, такие как «маленькая собака - собака» или «маленькая собака - животное», для которых можно предположить гипернимическую связь. Во-вторых, мы используем генеративные состязательные сети (GAN) для генерации пар векторов, для которых также можно предположить гипернимическое отношение. Кроме того, мы представляем две дополнительные стратегии расширения существующего набора данных за счет использования лингвистических ресурсов, таких как WordNet. Используя оценку 3 различных наборов данных для обнаружения гипернимии и 2 различных векторных пространств, мы демонстрируем, что обе предложенные стратегии автоматического увеличения данных и расширения набора данных существенно улучшают производительность классификатора.', 'ga': 'Is fadhb dhúshlánach in NLP í braite uathoibríoch na gcaidreamh hypernymy. Go ginearálta, cuireadh bac ar chur i bhfeidhm rathúil na gcur chuige maoirsithe úrscothach ag baint úsáide as uiríll dáilte de bharr infhaighteacht teoranta sonraí oiliúna ardchaighdeáin. Tá dhá theicníc nua méadaithe sonraí forbartha againn a ghineann samplaí oiliúna nua as na cinn atá ann cheana féin. Ar an gcéad dul síos, déanaimid na prionsabail theangeolaíocha de transitivity hipirnim agus comhdhéanamh trasnánach modhnóirí-ainmfhocail a chomhcheangal chun péirí breise veicteoirí a ghiniúint, mar shampla “madra beag” nó “madra beag - ainmhí”, ar féidir glacadh leis go bhfuil gaol hipearainmeach ann. Ar an dara dul síos, bainimid úsáid as líonraí sáraíochta giniúna (GANanna) chun péirí veicteoirí a ghiniúint ar féidir glacadh leis freisin go bhfuil baint ag hipearnamaíocht leis. Thairis sin cuirimid dhá straitéis chomhlántacha i láthair chun tacar sonraí atá ann cheana a leathnú trí acmhainní teangeolaíocha ar nós WordNet a ghiaráil. Trí úsáid a bhaint as meastóireacht ar 3 thacar sonraí difriúla chun hipearainmneacha a bhrath agus 2 spás veicteora dhifriúla, léirímid go bhfeabhsaítear feidhmíocht aicmitheora go suntasach leis na straitéisí um mhéadú sonraí uathoibríocha agus um shíneadh tacar sonraí atá beartaithe.', 'ka': "ჰიპერნიმის შესახებების ავტომატური განახლება NLP-ში გამოსახულებელი პრობლემა. წარმატებული მომხმარების შესაძლებელი მომხმარება, რომელიც გამოყენებულიან გამოიყენებული გამოსახულებული გამოსახულებული გამოსახულებული გამოსახულებული გამოსახულებული გამოსახულება, უფრო ჩვენ ორი პრომენტიური მონაცემების აგექტენტირების ტექნოგიები განვითარეთ, რომლებიც ახალი განვითარების მაგალითების შექმნა. პირველად, ჩვენ ჰიპერნიმის გადატანიცხოვრება და კომპორექტიური შეცვლელების კომპოზიციის ენერგისტიკური პრინციპების შემყვარება, როგორც 'პატარა კსეტი - კსეტი' ან 'პატარა კსეტი - ცხოვრება', რომ მეორე, ჩვენ გამოყენებთ გენერაციური ნეტებერიალური ქსელები (GANs) ვიქნებისთვის ვიქნებისთვის ვიქნებისთვის, რომლებიც ჰიპერნიმიური შესახებ შეიძლება იყოს. ჩვენ შემდეგ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ორი კომპლემენტური სტრატიგიები, რომლებიც WordNet-ის სისტემისტიკური რესურსების გამოყენებით. სამი განსხვავებული მონაცემების გამოყენება ჰიპერნიმის განახლებისთვის და ორი განსხვავებული გვეკტორის განახლებისთვის, ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ორივე მონაცემებული ავტომატიკური მონაცემების აგგენტირება", 'el': 'Η αυτόματη ανίχνευση των σχέσεων υπερνυμίας αντιπροσωπεύει ένα δύσκολο πρόβλημα στο ΝΛΠ. Η επιτυχής εφαρμογή υπερσύγχρονων εποπτευόμενων προσεγγίσεων με κατανεμημένες αναπαραστάσεις παρεμποδίζεται γενικά από την περιορισμένη διαθεσιμότητα υψηλής ποιότητας δεδομένων κατάρτισης. Έχουμε αναπτύξει δύο νέες τεχνικές αύξησης δεδομένων που παράγουν νέα παραδείγματα κατάρτισης από τα υπάρχοντα. Πρώτον, συνδυάζουμε τις γλωσσικές αρχές της μεταβασιμότητας υπερνύμων και της διατομευτικής σύνθεσης τροποποιητή-ουσιαστικού για να δημιουργήσουμε πρόσθετα ζεύγη διανυσμάτων, όπως το "μικρό σκυλί προς ζώο" ή το "μικρό σκυλί προς ζώο", για τα οποία μπορεί να θεωρηθεί μια σχέση υπερνύμων. Δεύτερον, χρησιμοποιούμε αναπαραγωγικά αντικρουόμενα δίκτυα (GAN) για την παραγωγή ζευγαριών διανυσμάτων για τα οποία μπορεί επίσης να θεωρηθεί η σχέση υπερνυμίας. Επιπλέον, παρουσιάζουμε δύο συμπληρωματικές στρατηγικές για την επέκταση ενός υπάρχοντος συνόλου δεδομένων χρησιμοποιώντας γλωσσικούς πόρους όπως το WordNet. Χρησιμοποιώντας μια αξιολόγηση σε τρία διαφορετικά σύνολα δεδομένων για ανίχνευση υπερνύμων και δύο διαφορετικούς διανυσματικούς χώρους, καταδεικνύουμε ότι τόσο οι προτεινόμενες στρατηγικές αυτόματης αύξησης δεδομένων όσο και η επέκταση συνόλων δεδομένων βελτιώνουν σημαντικά την απόδοση του ταξινομητή.', 'hu': 'A hipernimiás kapcsolatok automatikus felismerése kihívást jelent az NLP-ben. Az elosztott reprezentációkat alkalmazó korszerű, felügyelt megközelítések sikeres alkalmazását általában akadályozta a kiváló minőségű képzési adatok korlátozott rendelkezésre állása. Két új adatbővítési technikát fejlesztettünk ki, amelyek új képzési példákat generálnak a meglévőkből. Először is kombináljuk a hiperním tranzitivitás és az intersektív módosító-főnév kompozíció nyelvi elveit, hogy további vektorpárokat generáljunk, mint például "kis kutya - kutya" vagy "kis kutya - állat", amelyeknél hipernímia kapcsolat feltételezhető. Másodszor generációs ellenfélhálózatokat (GAN-okat) használunk olyan vektorpárok létrehozására, amelyeknél hipernimiás kapcsolat is feltételezhető. Továbbá két kiegészítő stratégiát mutatunk be egy meglévő adatkészlet bővítésére olyan nyelvi erőforrások felhasználásával, mint a WordNet. 3 különböző adatkészleten és 2 különböző vektorteren végzett értékeléssel bebizonyítjuk, hogy mind a javasolt automatikus adatbővítési, mind az adatkészlet kiterjesztési stratégiák jelentősen javítják az osztályozók teljesítményét.', 'it': "Il rilevamento automatico delle relazioni di ipernimia rappresenta un problema impegnativo in PNL. L'applicazione efficace di approcci supervisionati all'avanguardia che utilizzano rappresentazioni distribuite è stata generalmente ostacolata dalla limitata disponibilità di dati formativi di alta qualità. Abbiamo sviluppato due nuove tecniche di aumento dei dati che generano nuovi esempi di formazione da quelli esistenti. In primo luogo, combiniamo i principi linguistici della transitività ipernimica e la composizione intersettiva modificatore-sostantivo per generare ulteriori coppie di vettori, come 'cane piccolo - cane' o 'cane piccolo - animale', per i quali si può presumere una relazione ipernimica. In secondo luogo, utilizziamo reti adversariali generative (GAN) per generare coppie di vettori per i quali si può anche ipotizzare la relazione ipernimica. Presentiamo inoltre due strategie complementari per estendere un set di dati esistente sfruttando risorse linguistiche come WordNet. Utilizzando una valutazione su 3 diversi set di dati per il rilevamento dell'ipernimia e 2 diversi spazi vettoriali, dimostriamo che entrambe le strategie di aumento automatico dei dati proposte e di estensione del set di dati migliorano notevolmente le prestazioni del classificatore.", 'mk': 'Автоматското детектирање на врските со хипернимија претставува предизвикувачки проблем во НЛП. Успешната апликација на најсовремените надгледувани пристапи користејќи дистрибуирани претставници генерално е попречена од ограничената достапност на висококвалитетни податоци за обука. Развивме две нови техники за зголемување на податоците кои генерираат нови примери за обука од постојните. Прво, ги комбинираме лингвистичките принципи на хипернимна транзитивност и меѓусективната модификација на името за да генерираме дополнителни парови вектори, како што се „мало куче - куче“ или „мало куче - животно“, за кои може да се претпостави хипернимска врска. Второ, користиме генеративни противнички мрежи (ГАН) за да генерираме парови вектори за кои може да се претпостави и хипернимиска врска. Покрај тоа, претставуваме две комплементарни стратегии за проширување на постоечкиот податок со искористување на јазичките ресурси како што е WordNet. Using an evaluation across 3 different datasets for hypernymy detection and 2 different vector spaces, we demonstrate that both of the proposed automatic data augmentation and dataset extension strategies substantially improve classifier performance.', 'kk': "Хипернимнің қатынасын автоматты түрде анықтау NLP- де мәселе болады. Бөлшектелген таңбашаларды қолданудың күй- жай бақылау әдістерінің сәтті бағдарламасы кәдімгі сапатты оқыту деректерінің шектелген жеткізіліктерінен бұғатталды. Біз жаңа оқыту мысалдарын бар жағдайдан жасайтын екі романдық деректерді көбейту техникасын жасадық. Біріншіден, біз гипернимді ауыстыру және көлеңсективті өзгерту атауының лингвистикалық принциптерін біріктіреміз, мысалы 'кішкентай жүгірткі - жүгірткі' немесе 'кішкентай жүгірткі - жануарлық' деп, гипернимдік қатынасы қ Екіншіден, біз гипернимнің қатынасы қолданылатын векторларды құру үшін генеративті қарсы желі (GANs) қолданымыз. Сонымен қатар, WordNet секілді лингвистикалық ресурстарды өзгерту үшін қосымша екі стратегия келтіреміз. Гипернимді анықтау үшін 3 түрлі деректер баптауларын және 2 түрлі вектор бос орындарын бағалау үшін біз қолданылатын автоматты деректер қосу және деректер қосу кеңейту стратегияларының екеуінде классификациялық істеу", 'lt': 'Automatinis hiperinimos ryšių nustatymas yra sunki NLP problem a. Sėkmingai taikyti moderniausius prižiūrimus metodus naudojant paskirstytus atstovus paprastai trukdė ribotas aukštos kokybės mokymo duomenų prieinamumas. Sukūrėme du naujus duomenų didinimo metodus, kurie sukuria naujus mokymo pavyzdžius iš esamų. Pirma, mes deriname kalbinius hipernimo tranzitumo ir tarpsekcinio modifikatoriaus sudėties principus, kad būtų sukurtos papildomos pernešėjų poros, pavyzdžiui, "mažas šunis - šunis" arba "mažas šunis - gyvūnas", dėl kurių galima daryti hipernimo ryšį. Antra, mes naudojame generacinius priešingus tinklus (GAN) kurdami poras vektorių, kurių hipernimijos santykis taip pat gali būti laikomas. Be to, pristatome dvi papildomas strategijas, skirtas išplėsti esamą duomenų rinkinį naudojant tokius kalbinius išteklius kaip WordNet. Naudodami vertinimą iš trijų skirtingų duomenų rinkinių, skirtų hipernimijai nustatyti, ir iš dviejų skirtingų vektorių erdvių, mes įrodome, kad abi siūlomos automatinio duomenų didinimo ir duomenų rinkinio išplėtimo strategijos gerokai pagerina klasifikatorių veiksmingumą.', 'ml': 'The automatic detection of hypernymy relationships represents a challenging problem in NLP.  വിതരണ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന സ്റ്റേറ്റ്- ഓ- ആര്\u200dട്ട് നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട സ്ഥാനങ്ങളുടെ വിജയിച്ച പ്രയോഗത്തിന്റെ സ നിലവിലുള്ള പുതിയ പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്ന രണ്ട് നോവല്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ കൂട്ടുന്നതിനുള്ള സാങ ആദ്യം, നമ്മള്\u200d ഹൈപ്പെര്\u200dണിമിന്\u200dറെ മാറ്റുന്നതിന്\u200dറെയും കൂടുതല്\u200d മോഡിഫയര്\u200d നൂന്\u200dറിന്\u200dറെയും ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെയും നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. കൂടുതല്\u200d ജോഡി വെക്റ്റര്\u200d ഉണ്ട രണ്ടാമതായി, നമ്മള്\u200d ജനററിവ് വിരോധമായ നെറ്ററുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അതിനാല്\u200d ഹൈപ്പരിമി ബന്ധമുണ്ടാക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കും. വോര്\u200dഡ് നെറ്റ് പോലുള്ള ഭാഷ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d വിവരിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നതിനായി നിലവിലുള്ള ഡാറ്റാസ്റ്റേറ്റ് വിശേഷിപ്പ മൂന്നു വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200dക്കും വ്യത്യസ്ത വെക്റ്റര്\u200d സ്പെയിനുകള്\u200dക്കും മുകളില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡേറ്റാസെറ്റുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് പ്രോദ', 'mn': 'Хиперним харилцааны автоматаар олох нь NLP-д хэцүү асуудал юм. Урлагийн улс төрийн удирдлагатай арга барилгуудын амжилттай хэрэглээ хуваарилагдсан үзүүлэлтийг ашиглан ихэвчлэн өндөр чанарын сургалтын мэдээллийн хязгаарлагдсан байдаг. Бид хоёр шинэ өгөгдлийн нэмэлт техник бүтээсэн бөгөөд сургалтын шинэ жишээ гаргадаг. Эхлээд бид гиперним шилжүүлэлтийн хэлний зарчмыг нэгтгэнэ. Харин огтлолцогчийн нэмэлт векторууд үүсгэх мэт "жижиг нохой - нохой" эсвэл "жижиг нохой - амьтан" хэмээх хэлбэрүүдийг нэгтгэнэ. Хоёрт, бид гиперним холбоотой холбоотой хоёр векторуудыг бий болгох эсрэг сүлжээг ашиглаж байна. Мөн бид WordNet гэх мэт хэлний нөөцийг ашиглаж байгаа өгөгдлийн санг нэмэгдүүлэхэд хоёр нэмэлт стратеги өгсөн. Хиперним оногдохын тулд 3 өөр өгөгдлийн сангуудыг ашиглан 2 өөр вектор орон зайд автоматически өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэлт болон өгөгдлийн сангуудын нэмэгдүүлэлтийн стратеги хоёр нь илүү хуваалцах үйл ажиллагааг илүү сайжруулж байна.', 'ms': "Pengesanan automatik hubungan hipernimi mewakili masalah yang menantang dalam NLP. Aplikasi yang berjaya bagi pendekatan yang diawasi state-of-the-art menggunakan perwakilan yang disebarkan secara umum telah dihalangi oleh kemampuan terbatas data latihan kualiti tinggi. Kami telah mengembangkan dua teknik peningkatan data baru yang menghasilkan contoh latihan baru dari teknik yang ada. First, we combine the linguistic principles of hypernym transitivity and intersective modifier-noun composition to generate additional pairs of vectors, such as 'small dog - dog' or 'small dog - animal', for which a hypernymy relationship can be assumed.  Kedua, kami menggunakan rangkaian musuh generatif (GAN) untuk menghasilkan pasangan vektor yang mana hubungan hipernimi juga boleh dianggap. Selain itu, kami mempersembahkan dua strategi tambahan untuk memperluas set data yang ada dengan menggunakan sumber bahasa seperti WordNet. Menggunakan penilaian melalui 3 set data yang berbeza untuk pengesan hipernimi dan 2 ruang vektor yang berbeza, kami menunjukkan bahawa kedua-dua penambahan data automatik yang diusulkan dan strategi sambungan set data meningkatkan prestasi pengeklasifikasi secara berarti.", 'ro': 'Detectarea automată a relațiilor hipernimice reprezintă o problemă provocatoare în PNL. Aplicarea cu succes a abordărilor supravegheate de ultimă oră care utilizează reprezentări distribuite a fost în general împiedicată de disponibilitatea limitată a datelor de formare de înaltă calitate. Am dezvoltat două tehnici noi de mărire a datelor care generează noi exemple de formare din cele existente. În primul rând, combinăm principiile lingvistice ale tranzitivității hipernimice și compoziția modificator-substantiv intersectiv pentru a genera perechi suplimentare de vectori, cum ar fi "câine mic - câine" sau "câine mic - animal", pentru care se poate presupune o relație hipernimică. În al doilea rând, folosim rețele adversare generative (GAN) pentru a genera perechi de vectori pentru care poate fi presupusă și relația hipernimică. În plus, prezentăm două strategii complementare pentru extinderea unui set de date existent prin valorificarea resurselor lingvistice precum WordNet. Folosind o evaluare pe 3 seturi de date diferite pentru detectarea hipernimii și 2 spații vectoriale diferite, demonstrăm că atât strategiile de augmentare automată a datelor propuse, cât și strategiile de extensie a setului de date îmbunătățesc substanțial performanța clasificatorului.', 'pl': 'Automatyczne wykrywanie relacji hipernimii stanowi trudny problem w NLP. Skuteczne stosowanie najnowocześniejszych podejść nadzorowanych przy użyciu reprezentacji rozproszonych było ogólnie utrudnione przez ograniczoną dostępność wysokiej jakości danych szkoleniowych. Opracowaliśmy dwie nowe techniki powiększania danych, które generują nowe przykłady treningowe z istniejących. Po pierwsze, łączymy językowe zasady przejściowości hipernimu i przeciętnego składu rzeczownika modyfikującego, aby wygenerować dodatkowe pary wektorów, takie jak "mały pies" lub "mały pies zwierzę", dla których można założyć relację hipernimii. Po drugie, używamy generatywnych sieci przeciwnych (GAN) do generowania par wektorów, dla których można również założyć relację hipernimii. Ponadto przedstawiamy dwie uzupełniające się strategie rozszerzania istniejącego zbioru danych poprzez wykorzystanie zasobów językowych, takich jak WordNet. Wykorzystując ocenę trzech różnych zbiorów danych do wykrywania hipernimii i dwóch różnych przestrzeni wektorowych, wykazujemy, że zarówno proponowane strategie automatycznego powiększania danych, jak i strategie rozszerzania zbiorów danych znacznie poprawiają wydajność klasyfikatora.', 'sr': "Automatski otkrivanje hipernimskih odnosa predstavlja izazovni problem u NLP-u. Uspješna primjena države umjetnosti nadziranih pristupa korištenjem raspodjeljenih predstavljanja općenito je ometana ograničenom dostupnošću podataka o visokoj kvaliteti obuke. Razvili smo dve nove tehnike povećanja podataka koje stvaraju nove primjere obuke od postojećih. Prvo, kombiniramo lingvističke principe hipernimske transicije i intersektivne modificijske imenske kompozicije kako bi stvorili dodatne pare vektora, kao što su 'mali pas - pas' ili 'mali pas - životinja', za koje se može pretpostaviti hipernimna veza. Drugo, koristimo generativne neprijateljske mreže (GAN) kako bi stvorili par vektora za koje se takođe može pretpostaviti povezanost s hipernimom. Nadalje predstavljamo dve dodatne strategije za proširenje postojećih podataka povećanjem jezičkih resursa poput WordNeta. Koristeći procjenu preko 3 različitih seta podataka za detekciju hipernimi i 2 različitih prostora vektora, pokazujemo da obje predložene strategije za povećanje automatskih podataka i proširenje seta podataka značajno poboljšavaju klasifikaciju.", 'si': 'හායිපර්නිමි සම්බන්ධයේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය පරීක්ෂණය NLP වල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතිදේශය කරනවා. විදුලි ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සමහර විශ්වාසයෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසයෙන් සීමාත්මක ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා අ අපි නියම දත්ත විශාලනය කරන්නේ අලුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නය උදාහරණ දෙකක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා. මුලින්, අපි සම්බන්ධ කළු භාෂාත්මක ප්\u200dරධානය සහ සම්බන්ධ වෙක්ටර්ස් සම්බන්ධය සම්බන්ධ වෙක්ටර්ස් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න භාෂාත්මක ප්\u200dරධානය සම්බන දෙවෙනි වෙක්ටර් ජීවිත විරෝධික ජාලය (GANs) භාවිත කරන්න, ඒ වගේම හායිපර්නිමි සම්බන්ධය සමඟත් විශේෂ කරන්න පු අපි තවත් පිළිගන්නේ වර්ඩනෙට් වගේ භාෂාවික සම්බන්ධයක් සඳහා තියෙන්න තොරතුරු සූදානයක් විස්තර කරන්න සඳහ හායිපර්නිමි පරීක්ෂණය සහ වෙනස් වෙක්ටර් ස්ථානය 2ක් වෙනුවෙන් තොරතුරු සැකසුම් 3ක් විසින් අවශ්\u200dයාවක් භාවිත කරනවා, අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ ක', 'sv': 'Automatisk upptäckt av hypernymymi-relationer utgör ett utmanande problem i NLP. En framgångsrik tillämpning av toppmoderna övervakade metoder med distribuerade representationer har i allmänhet försvårats av den begränsade tillgången på utbildningsdata av hög kvalitet. Vi har utvecklat två nya dataförstärkningstekniker som genererar nya träningsexempel från befintliga. Först kombinerar vi de språkliga principerna för hypernymtransitivitet och intersektiv modifieringssubstantiv sammansättning för att generera ytterligare par vektorer, såsom "liten hund - hund" eller "liten hund - djur", för vilka en hypernymi relation kan antas. För det andra använder vi generativa motståndareliga nätverk (GAN) för att generera vektorpar för vilka hypernymymrelationen också kan antas. Vi presenterar dessutom två kompletterande strategier för att utöka en befintlig datamängd genom att utnyttja språkliga resurser som WordNet. Med hjälp av en utvärdering över 3 olika datauppsättningar för hypernymymdetektering och 2 olika vektorrum visar vi att både de föreslagna automatiska dataaugmenteringsstrategierna och datauppsättningsutvidgningsstrategierna avsevärt förbättrar klassificerarens prestanda.', 'mt': "Id-detezzjoni awtomatika ta’ relazzjonijiet ta’ iperinimi tirrappreżenta problem a ta’ sfida fil-NLP. The successful application of state-of-the-art supervised approaches using distributed representations has generally been impeded by the limited availability of high quality training data.  We have developed two novel data augmentation techniques which generate new training examples from existing ones.  First, we combine the linguistic principles of hypernym transitivity and intersective modifier-noun composition to generate additional pairs of vectors, such as 'small dog - dog' or 'small dog - animal', for which a hypernymy relationship can be assumed.  It-tieni nett, aħna nużaw netwerks avversarji ġenerattivi (GANs) biex niġġeneraw par ta’ vetturi li għalihom tista’ tiġi preżunta wkoll ir-relazzjoni iperinimika. Barra minn hekk, qed nippreżentaw żewġ strateġiji kumplimentari għall-estensjoni ta’ sett ta’ dejta eżistenti billi ninfurzaw riżorsi lingwistiċi bħal WordNet. Bl-użu ta’ evalwazzjoni fi tliet settijiet differenti ta’ dejta għad-detezzjoni tal-iperinimi u f’żewġ spazji differenti ta’ vetturi, nagħmlu xhieda li ż-żewġ strateġiji ta’ żieda awtomatika tad-dejta proposti u estensjoni tad-dejta jtejbu b’mod sostanzjali l-prestazzjoni tal-klassifikatur.", 'ta': 'தானியங்கி கண்டுபிடிப்பு தொடர்புகளின் தானியங்கி NLP-ல் ஒரு சவாலான பிரச்சனையை குறிக்கும். வெற்றிகரமான பயன்பாட்டின் நிலைமை- கலை கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட முன்னேற்றங்களை பயன்படுத்தி பங்கிடப்பட்ட பிரதிப்புகள் பொதுவாக உயர்தர நாங்கள் இரண்டு புதிய தகவல் மேலும் தொழில்நுட்பத்தை உருவாக்கியிருக்கிறோம். இது நடப்பில் இருக்கும் பயிற முதலில், நாம் ஹைபெர்னிம் மாறுதல் மற்றும் இடைவெளி மாற்றி மாற்றி நூன் கூடுதல் ஜோடி வெக்டரை உருவாக்குவதற்கு மொத்தமான மொழிக்குறிப்பு இரண்டாவது, நாம் பொதுவான எதிர்பார்வை வலைப்பின்னல்களை பயன்படுத்தி ஜோடி வெக்டார்களை உருவாக்குகிறோம், அதிக உயர்ந்த உறவுகள் மற்று We furthermore present two complementary strategies for extending an existing dataset by leveraging linguistic resources such as WordNet.  மூன்று வேறு வித்திய தரவுத்தளங்கள் கண்டறிதல் மற்றும் இரண்டு வேறு வெக்டார் இடைவெளிகளுக்கு ஒரு மதிப்பெண்களை பயன்படுத்தி தானாக தானியங்கி தரவு அதிகரிப்பு செயல்', 'ur': "ہیپر نیمی رابطہ کی آٹوٹی شناسایی NLP میں ایک مشکل ہے۔ تقسیم کی تصویر کے مطابق قابل تحقیق کی موفقیت کی کاربری ہے، عموماً زیادہ کیفیت کی آموزش دیٹوں کی محدودیت کے مطابق محدودیت سے روکا گیا ہے. ہم نے دو نور ڈیٹا افزایش ٹیکنیک پیدا کئے ہیں جو موجود لوگوں سے نو ترکین مثالیں پیدا کرتی ہیں۔ پہلے، ہم ہیرنیم کی تغییرات کی زبان شناسی اصولوں کو ترکیب کرتے ہیں اور مختلف تغییر نام کی پیدائش کے لئے ویکتروں کے اضافہ جوڑے پیدا کرنے کے لئے، جیسے 'چھوٹے کت - کت - کت' یا 'چھوٹے کت - جانور', جسے ایک ہیرنیمی رابطہ سمجھ سکتا ہے. دوسرا، ہم مخالف نیٹورک (GANs) کو استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ ویکتروں کے جوڑے پیدا کریں جن کے لئے ہیرنیمی ارتباط بھی سمجھ سکتی ہے. ہم اس کے علاوہ دو تعداد استراتژی پیش کرتے ہیں کہ ایک موجود ڈیٹ سٹ کو گھیرنے کے لئے زبان رسولوں کی مثال WordNet کے ذریعہ لگا دیں۔ 3 مختلف ڈاٹ سٹ کے ذریعے ایک ارزیابی کا استعمال کرنا اور 2 مختلف ویکتور جگہ کا استعمال کرنا، ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ دونوں پیشنهاد کی اتماٹی ڈاٹ اضافہ کرنا اور ڈاٹ سٹ اضافہ استراتژی کلسٹر کرنا بہت اضافہ کریں", 'no': 'Automatisk oppdaging av hypernymrelasjonar representerer eit vanskeleg problem i NLP. Det lykkeleg bruken av tilnærmingar som er overvåka med distribuerte representasjonar er vanlegvis hindra av den begrensede tilgjengeligheten av høg kvalitetøvingsdata. Vi har utvikla to dataaugmentasjonske teknikk som lagar nye øvingseksemplar frå dei eksisterande. Først kombinerer vi den lingviske prinsippene av hypernyms overflytting og kryssektiv modifikasjonssnamnet for å laga fleire par vektorar, slik som « små hund - hund » eller « små hund - dyr », som ein hypernymforhold kan anta. Andre, bruker vi genererte negativnettverk (GANs) for å laga par vektorar som også kan anta hypernymrelasjonen. I tillegg presenterer vi to complementære strategiar for å utvide eit eksisterande dataset ved å levera språkstiske ressursar som WordNet. Bruk eit evaluering over 3 ulike datasett for hypernymoppdaging og 2 ulike vektormellomrom, viser vi at både av dei foreslåde automatiske dataaugmentasjonen og datasettutvidingsstrategiane er vanlegvis forbetra klassifiseringsfunksjonen.', 'so': "The automatic detection of hypernymy relationships represents a challenging problem in NLP.  Si guulaysan u codsashada hababka farshaxanka lagu ilaaliyo isticmaalka wakiilayaasha lagu kala qaybiyey waxaa inta badan ka adkaaday helitaanka macluumaadka waxbarashada takhasuska sare. Waxaannu horumarinnay laba tacliin kordhiska macluumaadka ee warqada ah, taasoo ka dhalata tusaalooyin cusub oo ah kuwa jira. Marka ugu horeysa, waxaynu isku darsameynaa qaybaha afka ah ee bedelka iyo kooxa bedelka ah si aan u soo saarno wadooyin kale oo kale, tusaale ahaan 'eey yar' ama 'eey yar', xayawaan, taas oo aad u malayn karto xiriir dheeraad ah. Second, waxaynu isticmaalnaa shabakado wax ka gees ah (GAN) si aan u soo saarno wadooyin labo ah, taas oo lagu tirin karo xiriirka jaamacadda. Sidoo kale waxaan keenaynaa laba strategiyo oo complex ah oo aan sii fidinno taariikhda joogta, sida WordNet. Sida aan wax ku qiimeynayno 3-satura oo kala duduwan oo ay u baahan yihiin jaamacadda iyo 2 meelo kala duduwan oo vector ah, waxaynu muujinnaa in labada laguu soo jeeday kordhinta macluumaadka oo automatika ah iyo qorshaha kordhinta databaseta si weyn u hagaajiyaa tababarida.", 'vi': 'Việc phát hiện tự động các mối quan hệ siêu nữ đại diện cho một vấn đề khó khăn ở Njala. Việc áp dụng các phương pháp được giám sát kỹ thuật hàng đầu bằng các biểu tượng được phát tán đã bị cản trở bởi việc có hạn chế cung cấp dữ liệu đào tạo chất lượng cao. Chúng tôi đã phát triển hai kỹ thuật gia tăng dữ liệu mới tạo ra những trường hợp mới từ các trường hợp đã có. Đầu tiên, chúng ta kết hợp các nguyên tắc ngôn ngữ của sự chuyển đổi siêu nữ và cấu tạo bổ trợ từ danh từ nhau để tạo ra các cặp sinh vật khác như "chó nhỏ" hay "chó nhỏ"động vật"để mà có thể đảm bảo mối quan hệ siêu nữ. Thứ hai, chúng tôi sử dụng các mạng phản nghịch tạo ra các cặp sinh vật trung gian để tạo ra các mối liên hệ siêu nữ. Chúng tôi còn đưa ra hai chiến lược bổ sung để mở rộng dữ liệu tồn tại bằng cách sử dụng nguồn lực ngôn ngữ như WordNet. Sử dụng một đánh giá bao gồm ba bộ dữ liệu khác nhau để phát hiện siêu cuồng và hai khoảng vector khác nhau, chúng tôi chứng minh cả hai chiến lược gia tăng dữ liệu tự động và phần mở rộng tập tin đã đề nghị cải thiện khả năng phân loại.', 'uz': 'Hypermaniy munosabatlarni avtomatik aniqlash NLP\'da murakkab muammolarni anglatadi. @ info: status Biz ikkita novel maʼlumot qoʻshish tugmalarini yaratdik. Bu mavjud narsalardan yangi trening misollarini yaratadi. Birinchi so\'zda, biz hypernimning tarjima va intersektiv o\'zgarishni o\'zgartirish qoidalarini birlashtiramiz va qo\'shimcha vektorlarni qo\'shish uchun "kichkina dog" yoki "kichkina dog" yoki "kichkina dog" yoki "kichkina dog" yosh" qo\'shilgan qoidalarni birlashtiramiz. Bu bilan, hypernity munosabatlarini tasavvur qil Ikkinchi so\'zda, biz generativ raqamli tarmoqlarga (GAN) ishlatamiz va u uchun hypernymiz aloqalarini tasavvur qilish mumkin. Ko\'pchilik, WordNet kabi tillar murakkablarini yozib olish uchun ikkita murakkablik strategiya yordam beramiz. Hypermani aniqlash va ikkita boshqa vektor boʻsh joylari uchun uchta boshqa maʼlumot tarkibini ishlatishdan foydalanish mumkin. Biz rivojlanadigan avtomatik maʼlumot soʻzlashtirish va maʼlumot kengaytmasi strategiyasi murakkab darajalashtirish imkoniyatini oshirish imkoniyatini ko\'rsatdik.', 'bg': 'Автоматичното откриване на хипернимични връзки представлява предизвикателен проблем в НЛП. Успешното прилагане на най-съвременни надзорни подходи, използващи разпределени представи, обикновено е възпрепятствано от ограничената наличност на висококачествени данни за обучение. Разработихме две нови техники за увеличаване на данните, които генерират нови примери за обучение от съществуващи. Първо, комбинираме лингвистичните принципи на хипернимната преходност и пресечната модификаторна композиция на съществителното, за да генерираме допълнителни двойки вектори, като например "малко куче - куче" или "малко куче - животно", за които може да се приеме хипернимна връзка. Второ, използваме генеративни противоречиви мрежи (ГАН), за да генерираме двойки вектори, за които може да се приеме и хипернимичната връзка. Освен това представяме две допълващи се стратегии за разширяване на съществуващ набор от данни чрез използване на езикови ресурси като WordNet. Използвайки оценка на 3 различни набора от данни за откриване на хипернимия и 2 различни векторни пространства, ние демонстрираме, че предложените стратегии за автоматично увеличаване на данните и разширение на набора от данни значително подобряват ефективността на класификатора.', 'hr': "Automatski otkrivanje hipernimskih odnosa predstavlja izazovni problem u NLP-u. Uspješna primjena nadzornih pristupa države umjetnosti koristeći raspodjeljene predstave općenito je ometana ograničenom dostupnošću podataka o visokoj kvaliteti obuke. Razvili smo dvije nove tehnike povećanja podataka koje stvaraju nove primjere obuke od postojećih. Prvo, kombiniramo lingvističke principe prelaznosti hipernima i intersektivne modificijske imene kompozicije kako bi stvorili dodatne pare vektora, poput 'malih psa - psa' ili 'malih psa - životinja', za koje se može pretpostaviti hipernim odnos. Drugo, koristimo generativne adversarne mreže (GAN) kako bi stvorili par vektora za koje se također može pretpostaviti povezanost s hipernimom. Nadalje predstavljamo dvije dodatne strategije za proširenje postojećih podataka povećanjem jezičkih resursa poput WordNeta. Koristeći procjenu preko 3 različitih podataka za otkrivanje hipernimi i 2 različitih vektorskih prostora, pokazujemo da obje predložene strategije za povećanje automatskih podataka i proširenje podataka značajno poboljšavaju klasifikaciju.", 'da': "Den automatiske detektion af hypernymi-relationer repræsenterer et udfordrende problem i NLP. En vellykket anvendelse af avancerede overvågede metoder ved hjælp af distribuerede repræsentationer er generelt blevet hæmmet af den begrænsede tilgængelighed af uddannelsesdata af høj kvalitet. Vi har udviklet to nye data augmentation teknikker, der genererer nye træningseksempler fra eksisterende. For det første kombinerer vi de sproglige principper for hypernymtransitivitet og intersektiv modifikator-substantiv sammensætning for at generere yderligere par vektorer, såsom 'lille hund - hund' eller 'lille hund - dyr', for hvilke der kan antages en hypernymi relation. For det andet bruger vi generative adversarial netværk (GAN'er) til at generere par vektorer, for hvilke hypernymi relationen også kan antages. Vi præsenterer desuden to supplerende strategier for at udvide et eksisterende datasæt ved at udnytte sproglige ressourcer som WordNet. Ved hjælp af en evaluering på tværs af 3 forskellige datasæt til hypernymy detektion og 2 forskellige vektorrum viser vi, at både de foreslåede automatiske datastørrelsesstrategier og datasætteudvidelsesstrategier forbedrer klassificeringens ydeevne betydeligt.", 'nl': "De automatische detectie van hyperniemierelaties vormt een uitdagend probleem in NLP. De succesvolle toepassing van state-of-the-art begeleide benaderingen met behulp van gedistribueerde representaties is over het algemeen belemmerd door de beperkte beschikbaarheid van hoogwaardige opleidingsgegevens. We hebben twee nieuwe data augmentatie technieken ontwikkeld die nieuwe trainingsvoorbeelden genereren uit bestaande technieken. Eerst combineren we de linguïstische principes van hyperniem transitiviteit en intersectieve modifier-zelfstandig naamwoord compositie om extra paren vectoren te genereren, zoals 'small dog' of 'small dog to animal', waarvoor een hyperniemierelatie kan worden verondersteld. Ten tweede gebruiken we generative adversarial networks (GAN's) om vectorparen te genereren waarvoor ook de hyperniemierelatie kan worden verondersteld. Daarnaast presenteren we twee complementaire strategieën voor het uitbreiden van een bestaande dataset door gebruik te maken van taalkundige bronnen zoals WordNet. Aan de hand van een evaluatie van drie verschillende datasets voor hyperniemiedetectie en twee verschillende vectorruimten, tonen we aan dat zowel de voorgestelde automatische data augmentatie als dataset uitbreidingsstrategieën de classificator prestaties aanzienlijk verbeteren.", 'id': "The automatic detection of hypernymy relationships represents a challenging problem in NLP.  The successful application of state-of-the-art supervised approaches using distributed representations has generally been impeded by the limited availability of high quality training data.  Kami telah mengembangkan dua teknik peningkatan data baru yang menghasilkan contoh latihan baru dari yang ada. First, we combine the linguistic principles of hypernym transitivity and intersective modifier-noun composition to generate additional pairs of vectors, such as 'small dog - dog' or 'small dog - animal', for which a hypernymy relationship can be assumed.  Kedua, kita menggunakan jaringan pemberontak generatif (GAN) untuk menghasilkan pasangan vektor yang mana hubungan hipernimi juga dapat dianggap. We furthermore present two complementary strategies for extending an existing dataset by leveraging linguistic resources such as WordNet.  Using an evaluation across 3 different datasets for hypernymy detection and 2 different vector spaces, we demonstrate that both of the proposed automatic data augmentation and dataset extension strategies substantially improve classifier performance.", 'de': 'Die automatische Erkennung von Hypernymienbeziehungen stellt ein herausforderndes Problem in NLP dar. Die erfolgreiche Anwendung modernster überwachter Ansätze mittels verteilter Repräsentationen wurde in der Regel durch die begrenzte Verfügbarkeit hochwertiger Trainingsdaten behindert. Wir haben zwei neuartige Datenerweiterungstechniken entwickelt, die aus bestehenden Trainingsbeispielen neue generieren. Zunächst kombinieren wir die linguistischen Prinzipien der Hypernym-Transitivität und der intersektiven Modifikator-Substantiv-Zusammensetzung, um zusätzliche Vektorpaare zu generieren, wie z.B. "kleiner Hund-Hund" oder "kleiner Hund-Tier", für die eine Hypernyme-Beziehung angenommen werden kann. Zweitens verwenden wir generative adversarian networks (GANs), um Vektorpaare zu generieren, für die auch die Hypernymiebeziehung angenommen werden kann. Darüber hinaus präsentieren wir zwei komplementäre Strategien zur Erweiterung eines bestehenden Datensatzes durch Nutzung sprachlicher Ressourcen wie WordNet. Anhand einer Auswertung über drei verschiedene Datensätze zur Hypernymieerkennung und zwei verschiedene Vektorräume zeigen wir, dass sowohl die vorgeschlagenen automatischen Datenaufwandlungsstrategien als auch die Datensatzerweiterungsstrategien die Klassifizierungsleistung erheblich verbessern.', 'ko': "하이퍼동명 관계에 대한 자동 감지는 NLP의 문제 중 하나입니다.고품질 훈련 데이터의 유한한 가용성은 일반적으로 분포식 표시를 사용하는 선진적인 감독 방법의 성공적인 응용을 방해한다.우리는 두 가지 새로운 데이터 증강 기술을 개발하여 기존의 데이터에서 새로운 훈련 예시를 생성할 수 있다.우선, 우리는 초어와 물성과 교차 수식어-명사 조합의 언어학 원리를 결합시켜'강아지-개'나'강아지-동물'같은 추가 벡터를 생성하여 그들 사이에 초어 관계가 존재한다고 가정할 수 있다.그 다음에 우리는 생성적 대항망(GANs)을 사용하여 벡터 쌍을 생성하고 상하 동명 관계를 가정할 수 있다.그 밖에 WordNet 등 언어 자원을 이용하여 기존 데이터 집합을 확장하는 두 가지 상호 보완 전략도 제시했다.3개의 서로 다른 초동명 검측 데이터 집합과 2개의 서로 다른 벡터 공간에 대한 평가를 통해 우리는 제시된 자동 데이터 확장과 데이터 집합 확장 전략이 분류기의 성능을 현저히 향상시켰다는 것을 증명했다.", 'sw': "Kugundua uhusiano wa umeme unawakilisha tatizo la changamoto nchini NLP. Utumiaji wa mafanikio wa hali ya sanaa unaothibitiwa kwa kutumia uwakilishi wa usambazaji kwa ujumla umezuiwa na upatikanaji mdogo wa taarifa za mafunzo ya kiwango kikubwa. Tumeunda mbinu za kuongeza taarifa za riwaya mbili zinazotengeneza mifano mpya ya mafunzo kutoka kwa zile zilizopo. First, we combine the linguistic principles of hypernym transitivity and intersective modifier-noun composition to generate additional pairs of vectors, such as 'small dog - dog' or 'small dog - animal', for which a hypernymy relationship can be assumed.  Pili, tunatumia mitandao mbadala ya kijana (GAN) kutengeneza vector mbili ambazo mahusiano yanaweza kudhaniwa pia. Zaidi ya hayo tunaweka mbinu mbili za kompyuta za kupanua seti ya taarifa zilizopo kwa kutumia rasilimali za lugha kama vile WordNet. Kwa kutumia uchunguzi wa taarifa tatu tofauti za uchunguzi wa umeme na sehemu mbili tofauti za vector, tunaonyesha kuwa mbili zinazopendekezwa kuongeza taarifa za kujitegemea na mpango wa kuongezeka kwa taarifa kwa kiasi kikubwa wa kuboresha utendaji wa usambazaji.", 'fa': 'کشف اتوماتیک رابطه های هیپرنیمی یک مشکل سخت در NLP نشان می دهد. کاربرد موفقیت موفقیت از روش\u200cهایی که با استفاده از نمایش\u200cهای پراکنده\u200cشده\u200cاند، از دسترسی محدودیت داده\u200cهای آموزش کیفیت بالا تحت تاثیر قرار گرفته است. ما دو تکنیک افزایش داده\u200cهای رمانی را توسعه کردیم که مثال آموزش جدید از موجودات وجود دارد. اول، ما اصولات زبان\u200cشناسی از تغییر تغییر نام\u200cشناسی و تغییر نام\u200cشناسی را ترکیب می\u200cکنیم تا جفت\u200cهای بیشتر از ویکتورها را تولید کنیم، مثل سگ کوچک - سگ کوچک یا سگ کوچک - حیوانات، که برای آن یک رابطه\u200cی هوپر\u200cنیمی می\u200cتواند فرض شود. دوم، ما از شبکه های مخالفت (GANs) نسبت به تولید جفت ویکتورها استفاده می کنیم که ارتباط هیپرنیمی برای آن هم می\u200cتواند فرض شود. ما دوتا استراتژی اضافه برای گسترش یک مجموعه داده موجود را با تأثیر منابع زبان\u200cشناسی مثل WordNet پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. با استفاده از ارزیابی در ۳ مجموعه داده\u200cهای مختلف برای شناسایی هوپر نیمی و دو فضای ویکتور مختلف، نشان می\u200cدهیم که هر دو از استراتژی\u200cهای افزایش داده\u200cهای خودکار و مجموعه\u200cهای افزایش داده\u200cها پیشنهاد شده، عملکرد\u200cهای مختلف\u200cتر را زیاد بهتر', 'tr': "hipernimi baglaýyşlaryň otomatik a ňlap NLP'da çykyş mesele däldir. Aýratyn çykyş sistemasy ullanýan şekilde gözetlenýän hereketleriň üstünliki ýokary kwalitet maglumatynyň tapylşygy tarapyndan impedir edildi. Biz iki nowel maglumat ýetişdirmegi teknikelerini döredik. Bu ýagdaýlardan täze okuw örnekleri döretýär. Ilkinji gezek, hipernim göçürmeginiň lingwistiki prinsiplerini birleştirip, süýtgetmeli-süýtgetmeli işlemler üçin 'kiçi güjüň - güjüň' ýa 'kiçi güjüň - haywan', sebäbi hipernimi baglaýyşyň üýtgedilebilir. İkincisi, hipernimi ilişkisi de tahmin edilebilecek vektörler oluşturmak için teşkil teşkil ağları (GAN) kullanırız. Mundan hem WordNet ýaly lingwistiki çeşmeleri üçin bir maglumat setirini uzatmak üçin iki aşama stratejiýasyny görkezip. hipernimi deteksiyonyň üçin 3 farklı veri setirlerinden çözümlenmek üçin we 2 farklı vektör seleňleri ullanýarys. Biz hem teklif edilen otomatik maglumaty ýetişdirmek we veri setirmek strategiýasynyň klassifikatçi eserini gowylaşdyrmak üçin kanıtlandyrylýarys.", 'af': "Name Die suksesvolle toepassing van state-of-the-art-superviseerde toegange met gebruik van verspreidige voorstellings is algemeen gebrek deur die beperkte beskikbaarheid van hoë kwaliteit onderwerking data. Ons het twee nuwe data vergroot teknike ontwikkel wat nuwe onderwerp voorbeelde genereer van bestaande voorbeelde. Eerste, ons kombinieer die lingwisiese prinsipels van hypernyme-transitiviteit en intersektiewe modifier-noun-komponensie om addisionele paar vektore te genereer, soos 'klein hond - hond' of 'klein hond - dier', waarvan 'n hipernyme verhouding kan aangeneem word. Tweede, ons gebruik genereerde teenstandaaries netwerke (GANs) om paar vektore te genereer waarvoor die hipernimi verhouding ook kan aangeneem word. Ons stel daarna twee komplementare strategies voor om 'n bestaande datastel te uitbrei deur die verwysing van lingwisiese hulpbronne soos WordNet. Die gebruik van 'n evaluasie oor 3 verskillende datastelle vir hipernimi-opdekking en 2 verskillende vektorspasies, wys ons dat beide van die voorgestelde outomatiese data-augmentasie en datastel-uitbreidingsstrategies groot klassifiseerder-prestasie verbeter.", 'am': 'The automatic detection of hypernymy relationships represents a challenging problem in NLP.  የሥርዓት-አርእስት የተጠበቀው ደረጃዎች በተለየ ፕሬዚደሎችን በተለየ ቁጥር በተለየ ጥሩ ዳታዎችን በተለየ ግንኙነት አግኝቷል፡፡ ሁለትን የመረጃ ዳታ አጨማሪነት ስልጣናዎችን መፍጠር ነው፡፡ በመጀመሪያው፣ የቋንቋዊ ቋንቋዎች የhypernym ጥቅረት እና የግንኙነት አካባቢ አካባቢዎችን እናሳስባለን፣ እንደዚህም “ትንሽ ውሻ” ወይም “ትንሽ ውሻ” እንስሳ ነው፡፡ በሁለተኛው፣ የጠቅላላ ተቃዋሚ መረብ (GAN) እናስቀምጣለን፣ ለዚህም የፍጥረት ግንኙነት ደግሞ ይሸከምበታል፡፡ እንደWordNet በሚመስል የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች ሀብትን በመስጠት ሁለት ተጨማሪ strategies እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ በ3 ልዩ ዳታዎችን ለhypernymy ማግኘት እና ለሁለት ልዩ የዌctor ስፍራዎች በተለየን መጠቀም እና በተዘጋጀው የዳታ አካባቢ እና የዳታ አካባቢ ስርዓት መክፈቻን በአካባቢው ማሻሻል እናስታውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': "The automatic detection of hypernymy relationships represents a challenging problem in NLP.  Ավելի լավագույն վերահսկվող մոտեցումների հաջողակ կիրառումը, օգտագործելով տարածված ներկայացուցիչներ, ընդհանուր առմամբ արգելափակվել է բարձր որակի ուսուցման տվյալների սահմանափակ հասանելիության պատճառով Մենք զարգացել ենք երկու նոր տվյալների բարձրացման տեխնիկա, որոնք ստեղծում են գոյություն ունեցող նոր ուսուցման օրինակներ: First, we combine the linguistic principles of hypernym transitivity and intersective modifier-noun composition to generate additional pairs of vectors, such as 'small dog - dog' or 'small dog - animal', for which a hypernymy relationship can be assumed.  Երկրորդ, մենք օգտագործում ենք սերունդային հակառակորդ ցանցեր (ԳԱՆ) ստեղծելու համար մի զույգ վեկտորներ, որոնց համար հնարավոր է նաև ենթադրել հիպերնիմիայի հարաբերությունը: We furthermore present two complementary strategies for extending an existing dataset by leveraging linguistic resources such as WordNet.  Using an evaluation across 3 different datasets for hypernymy detection and 2 different vector spaces, we demonstrate that both of the proposed automatic data augmentation and dataset extension strategies substantially improve classifier performance.", 'az': "Hipernimi əlaqələrinin avtomatik təşkil edilməsi NLP'də çətin bir problemi göstərir. Bölünmüş göstəricilər vasitəsilə müvəffəqiyyəti təhsil edilənlərin müvəffəqiyyəti istifadə edilməsi yüksək kaliteli təhsil məlumatlarının müəyyən edilməsi təmin edildi. Biz iki yeni məlumat artırma tekniklərini təhsil etdik ki, həmin məlumatlardan yeni təhsil örnəkləri yaradır. İlk dəfə, hipernim keçişliyinin dillərini və müxtəlif dəyişiklik adlı kompozicisini birləşdiririk, bəlkə 'kiçik köpük - köpük' və ya 'kiçik köpük - hayvan' kimi, hipernimi ilişkisi olaraq təmin edə bilər. İkincisi, həmçinin hipernimi bağlantısı də hesab edilə biləcək iki vektör yaratmaq üçün generativ adversarial networks (GANs) istifadə edirik. Biz də WordNet kimi dil qaynaqlarını təmin edərək, mevcut bir veri qurğunu genişləmək üçün iki papildu strateji göstəririk. Hipernimi tanıtmaq üçün 3 müxtəlif veri qurğularının və 2 müxtəlif vektör yer arasında değerlendirməyi istifadə edirik ki, təklif edilmiş avtomatik veri artırması və veri qurğuları artırması stratejilərinin hər ikisini də klassifik performansını daha yaxşılaşdırır.", 'bn': "The automatic detection of hypernymy relationships represents a challenging problem in NLP.  বিতরণ করা প্রতিনিধিদের ব্যবহার করে রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের পর্যবেক্ষণের ক্ষেত্রে সফলভাবে প্রয়োগ করা হয়েছে উচ্চ মানের প্রশিক্ষণ তথ আমরা দুই নভেল ডাটা বাড়ানোর কৌশল তৈরি করেছি যা বিদ্যমান প্রশিক্ষণের উদাহরণ তৈরি করেছে। প্রথমত, আমরা হাইপারেনিম অতিবর্তনশীল এবং ইন্টারনেটিভ পরিবর্তন-নির্মাণের ভাষার নীতিগুলোকে একত্রিত করি, যেমন 'ছোট কুকুর- কুকুর- অথবা 'ছোট কুকুর- প্রাণী- যার জন্য একটি হাইপা দ্বিতীয়, আমরা জেনারেটিভ বিরোধী নেটওয়ার্ক (GAN) ব্যবহার করি যেখানে হাইপারেনিমির সম্পর্কেও ধারণা করা যাবে। এছাড়াও আমরা বিদ্যমান একটি ডাটাসেট প্রসারিত করার জন্য দুটি জটিল কৌশল উপস্থাপন করছি, যেমন ওয়ার্ডনেট। হাইপারেনিমি আবিষ্কার এবং দুই বিভিন্ন ভেক্টর স্পেসের জন্য ৩ ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ডাটাসেট ব্যবহার করে আমরা প্রস্তাবিত তথ্য যোগাযোগ এবং ডাটাসেট বিস্তারিত কৌশলে", 'ca': "The automatic detection of hypernymy relationships represents a challenging problem in NLP.  L'aplicació amb èxit d'enfocaments moderns supervisats utilitzant representacions distribuïdes s'ha impedit generalment per la limitada disponibilitat de dades d'formació d'alta qualitat. Hem desenvolupat dues noves tècniques d'augment de dades que generen nous exemples d'entrenament d'aquestes existents. First, we combine the linguistic principles of hypernym transitivity and intersective modifier-noun composition to generate additional pairs of vectors, such as 'small dog - dog' or 'small dog - animal', for which a hypernymy relationship can be assumed.  Segon, utilitzem xarxes adversaries generatives (GAN) per generar parells de vectors per als quals també es pot suposar la relació hipernimònica. We furthermore present two complementary strategies for extending an existing dataset by leveraging linguistic resources such as WordNet.  Utilitzant una evaluació en tres conjunts de dades diferents per la detecció de l'hipernimi i dos espais vectoris diferents, demostram que les estratègies proposades d'augment automàtic de les dades i d'estensió del conjunt de dades milloren substancialment el rendiment del classificador.", 'sq': "The automatic detection of hypernymy relationships represents a challenging problem in NLP.  The successful application of state-of-the-art supervised approaches using distributed representations has generally been impeded by the limited availability of high quality training data.  Kemi zhvilluar dy teknika të reja të rritjes së të dhënave që gjenerojnë shembuj të rinj trajnimi nga ato ekzistuese. First, we combine the linguistic principles of hypernym transitivity and intersective modifier-noun composition to generate additional pairs of vectors, such as 'small dog - dog' or 'small dog - animal', for which a hypernymy relationship can be assumed.  Second, we use generative adversarial networks (GANs) to generate pairs of vectors for which the hypernymy relation can also be assumed.  We furthermore present two complementary strategies for extending an existing dataset by leveraging linguistic resources such as WordNet.  Using an evaluation across 3 different datasets for hypernymy detection and 2 different vector spaces, we demonstrate that both of the proposed automatic data augmentation and dataset extension strategies substantially improve classifier performance.", 'et': 'Hüpernüümsete suhete automaatne tuvastamine kujutab endast NLP-is keerulist probleemi. Kõrgekvaliteediliste koolitusandmete piiratud kättesaadavus takistab üldiselt tipptasemel järelevalvemeetodite edukat rakendamist, kasutades hajutatud esitusi. Oleme välja töötanud kaks uut andmete suurendamise tehnikat, mis loovad olemasolevatest uutest koolitusnäidetest. Esiteks ühendame keelelised põhimõtted hüpernüümide transitiivsusest ja lõikuva modifikaatori-nimisõna koostisest, et luua täiendavaid vektoripaare, näiteks "väike koer – koer" või "väike koer – loom", mille puhul võib eeldada hüpernüümset seost. Teiseks kasutame generatiivseid vastasvõrke (GAN), et genereerida vektoripaare, mille puhul võib eeldada ka hüpernüümset seost. Lisaks esitame kaks täiendavat strateegiat olemasoleva andmekogumi laiendamiseks, kasutades keelelisi ressursse nagu WordNet. Kasutades hindamist kolme erineva andmekogumi hüpernüümia tuvastamiseks ja kahe erineva vektoriruumi vahel, näitame, et nii pakutud automaatse andmete suurendamise kui ka andmekogumi laiendamise strateegiad parandavad oluliselt klassifitseerija jõudlust.', 'bs': "Automatski otkrivanje hipernimskih odnosa predstavlja izazovni problem u NLP-u. Uspješna primjena nadzornih pristupa države umjetnosti koristeći raspodjeljene predstave općenito je ometana ograničenom dostupnošću podataka o visokoj kvaliteti obuke. Razvili smo dvije nove tehnike povećanja podataka koje stvaraju nove primjere obuke od postojećih. Prvo, kombiniramo jezičke principe prelaznosti hipernima i međusektivne kompozicije modifikatorskih imena kako bi stvorili dodatne pare vektora, poput 'malih psa - psa' ili 'malih psa - životinja', za koje se može pretpostaviti hipernim odnos. Drugo, koristimo generativne neprijateljske mreže (GAN) kako bi stvorili par vektora za koje se također može pretpostaviti povezanost s hipernimom. Nadalje predstavljamo dvije dodatne strategije za proširenje postojećih podataka povećanjem jezičkih resursa poput WordNeta. Koristeći procjenu preko 3 različitih seta podataka za detekciju hipernimi i 2 različitih prostora vektora, pokazujemo da obje predložene strategije za povećanje automatskih podataka i proširenje seta podataka značajno poboljšavaju klasifikaciju.", 'fi': 'Hypernyymisuhteiden automaattinen havaitseminen on haastava ongelma NLP:ssä. Laadukkaiden koulutustietojen rajallinen saatavuus on yleensä haitannut nykyaikaisten valvottujen lähestymistapojen menestyksekästä soveltamista hajautettujen esitysten avulla. Olemme kehittäneet kaksi uutta datan lisäystekniikkaa, jotka tuottavat uusia koulutusesimerkkejä olemassa olevista. Ensin yhdistämme kielelliset periaatteet hypernyymitransitiivisuudesta ja intersektiivisesta modifiointi-substantiivikoosteesta luodaksemme lisää vektoripareja, kuten "pieni koira - koira" tai "pieni koira - eläin", joille voidaan olettaa hypernyymisuhdetta. Toiseksi käytämme generatiivisia vastakkainasetteluverkkoja (GAN) vektoripareja, joille hypernyymisuhde voidaan olettaa. Lisäksi esittelemme kaksi toisiaan täydentävää strategiaa olemassa olevan aineiston laajentamiseksi hyödyntämällä kielellisiä resursseja, kuten WordNet. Arvioimalla kolmea eri datajoukkoa hypernyymin havaitsemiseksi ja kahta eri vektoriavaruutta, osoitamme, että sekä ehdotetut automaattiset datan lisäykset että datajoukkojen laajennusstrategiat parantavat merkittävästi luokittelijan suorituskykyä.', 'cs': 'Automatická detekce hypernymických vztahů představuje náročný problém NLP. Úspěšné aplikaci nejmodernějších kontrolovaných přístupů s využitím distribuovaných reprezentací bylo obecně bráněno omezenou dostupností vysoce kvalitních údajů o školení. Vyvinuli jsme dvě nové metody rozšíření dat, které generují nové vzdělávací příklady ze stávajících. Nejprve kombinujeme lingvistické principy transitivity hypernymů a kompozice intersektivního modifikátoru-podstatného jména k generování dalších párů vektorů, jako je například "malý pes" nebo "malý pes zvíře", pro které lze předpokládat hypernymický vztah. Za druhé používáme generační adversariální sítě (GAN) k generování párů vektorů, u nichž lze také předpokládat hypernymický vztah. Dále představujeme dvě doplňující se strategie pro rozšíření stávající datové sady využitím jazykových zdrojů, jako je WordNet. Pomocí vyhodnocení napříč třemi různými datovými sadami pro detekci hypernymií a dvěma různými vektorovými prostory demonstrujeme, že jak navrhované strategie automatického rozšíření dat, tak i strategie rozšíření datových sad výrazně zlepšují výkon klasifikátoru.', 'sk': 'Samodejno zaznavanje hipernimskih odnosov predstavlja zahteven problem v NLP. Uspešno uporabo najsodobnejših nadzorovanih pristopov z uporabo porazdeljenih predstavitev je na splošno ovirala omejena razpoložljivost visokokakovostnih podatkov o usposabljanju. Razvili smo dve novi tehniki povečanja podatkov, ki ustvarjata nove primere usposabljanja iz obstoječih. Najprej združujemo jezikovna načela hipernimske tranzitivnosti in presečne sestave modifikatorja-samostalnika, da ustvarimo dodatne pare vektorjev, kot sta "majhen pes – pes" ali "majhen pes – žival", za katere se lahko domneva hipernimska relacija. Drugič, uporabljamo generativna kontradiralna omrežja (GAN) za ustvarjanje parov vektorjev, za katere je mogoče domnevati tudi hipernimsko relacijo. Poleg tega predstavljamo dve dopolnilni strategiji za razširitev obstoječega nabora podatkov z izkoriščanjem jezikovnih virov, kot je WordNet. Z oceno 3 različnih naborov podatkov za odkrivanje hipernimije in 2 različnih vektorskih prostorov dokazujemo, da obe predlagani strategiji avtomatskega povečanja podatkov in razširitve naborov podatkov bistveno izboljšata učinkovitost klasifikatorja.', 'he': 'גילוי האוטומטי של מערכות יחסים היפרנימיות מייצג בעיה מאתגרת ב-NLP. השימוש המצליח של גישות מעודכנות בשימוש באמצעות מייצגים מרוחקים היה בדרך כלל מוגבל על ידי זמינות מוגבלת של נתוני אימון איכות גבוהה. פיתחנו שתי טכניקות גידול נתונים חדשות שמוצרות דוגמאות אימונים חדשות מאותות קיימות. ראשית, אנחנו משלבים את העקרונות הלשוניים של העברות היפרנימית וערכת משתנה-השם ביניהם כדי ליצור זוגות נוספים של ווקטורים, כמו "כלב קטן - כלב" או "כלב קטן - חיה", עבור מה ניתן להניח מערכת היפרנימיה. שנית, אנו משתמשים ברשתות יריבות יוצרות (GAN) כדי ליצור זוגות של ווקטורים שבהם גם ניתן להניח את מערכת היפרנימיה. בנוסף, אנחנו מציגים שני אסטרטגיות תוספות להאריך קבוצת נתונים קיימת על ידי ניצל משאבים שפתיים כמו WordNet. באמצעות הערכה בין 3 קבוצות נתונים שונות לזהות היפרנימיה ושני מקומות ווקטורים שונים, אנו מראים ששני המידע האוטומטי המוצע מגדל ואסטרטגיות ההארכה של קבוצת נתונים משתפרים באופן משמעותי את ההפעלות של הקליסדר.', 'ha': "Ina gane farat-farat danganta da ke cikin NLP yana da wata mataimaki mai tsanani. The successful application of state-of-the-art supervised approaches using distributed representations has generally been impeded by the limited availability of high quality training data.  Mun buɗe takwizaran data masu ƙaranci biyu na nowaya, wanda za'a ƙiƙira misãlai na ƙidãya daga masu jira. Kayyan da, muna haɗa misalin linguistic masu zama na transitiititi da tsohon-na-tarkiya zuwa a samo masu haɗi biyu masu sakawi, kamar misãlin 'na'yan kare' ko 'na'yan 'ƙarama', duk wanda za'a iya ƙayyade danganta. Piki, za'a yi amfani da wagon da ke motsi (GAN) dõmin ya ƙãga wasu shiryoyi biyu da za'a iya yi zafi da shi. Furan wannan, Muke zo da taki biyu masu ƙaranci da za'a shimfiɗa wani dataset wanda ke da shi a samu'a ga mai gajiya resource-linguistic kamar wordNet. Yi amfani da tunkuɗe kowace tsari 3 dabam-daban ga gane surori da filayen aiki 2 dabam-daban, ko, za mu nuna cewa, duk cikin shirin ayuka da aka goyyade ɗaɗaɗaɗe data farat ɗaya da shirin faɗi da aka daidaita database-faɗi, yana ƙara babban ajiya mai ƙayyade.", 'jv': 'AllProgressBar Aplikasi sistem perusahaan langkung-perusahaan neng akeh-perusahaan sing nguasai gampang Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing dibutuhke data nyebuti nggawe sistem sing nganggep sistem sing gawe kudu nyimpen anyar. First, we combine the Linguist guides of Hyernim transfer and intersection modification Second, we use Generative Advertural Network (GNs) to Genere parts of vectors for that the ultra-semi-conjugal ratio can be presumed. Awak dhéwé beraksi durung-sistem sing kompleter iki kanggo nggawe dataset sing wis ana dadi nggawe barang nggawe dolanan ingkang angka sing netambah kanggo Word net tutorial_BAR_', 'bo': 'NLP ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་དང་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རྟོགས་པ་དེ་ནི་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཡོད་པ མཐའ་འཁོར ང་ཚོས་གསར་གཏོད་ཅིག་གི་བཟོ་བཅོས་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་གསར་བསྐྲུན་བྱས་ཡོད། འདིས་ཀྱིས་གནས་ཡོད་པའི་དཔེར་བརྗོད་ས དང་པོ་དེ། ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གི་གྲངས གཉིས་པ། ང་ཚོས་བློ་བརྗོད་པའི་གདོང་རིམ་གྱི་དྲ་རྒྱ་ལྟར་བློ་གཏོང་གི་རྐྱེན་འབྲེལ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་མཐུད་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་དུས་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ཁ་སྐོང་བརྗོད་པར་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། Using an evaluation across 3 different datasets for hypernymy detection and 2 different vector spaces, we demonstrate that both of the proposed automatic data augmentation and dataset extension strategies substantially improve classifier performance.'}
{'en': 'Few-shot learning through contextual data augmentation', 'es': 'Aprendizaje rápido mediante el aumento de datos contextuales', 'ar': 'القليل من التعلم من خلال زيادة البيانات السياقية', 'fr': "Apprentissage en quelques étapes grâce à l'augmentation contextuelle des données", 'pt': 'Aprendizado em poucas etapas por meio do aumento de dados contextuais', 'zh': '以上下文数增少镜头学', 'ja': 'コンテキストデータの拡張による数少ない学習', 'hi': 'प्रासंगिक डेटा वृद्धि के माध्यम से कुछ शॉट सीखने', 'ru': 'Малоурочное обучение за счет увеличения контекстуальных данных', 'ga': 'Foghlaim bheagáin trí bhreisiú sonraí comhthéacsúla', 'ka': 'კონტექსტური მონაცემების აზექტუციაციის გასწავლება', 'hu': 'Kevés lehetőségű tanulás kontextuális adatbővítéssel', 'el': 'Μάθηση ελάχιστων στιγμών μέσω της αύξησης δεδομένων περιβάλλοντος', 'it': "Apprendimento a poche riprese attraverso l'aumento contestuale dei dati", 'kk': 'Контекстік деректерді көбейту арқылы кішкентай оқыту', 'lt': 'Mažas mokymasis didinant kontekstinius duomenis', 'ms': 'Pelajaran-gambar sedikit melalui peningkatan data kontekstual', 'ml': 'പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d കുറച്ച് വെടിയുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Tagħlim żgħir permezz ta’ żieda fid-dejta kuntestwali', 'mn': 'Бага зэрэг мэдээллийн нэмэгдүүлэлт суралцах нь', 'no': 'Få bilete læring gjennom kontekstlege data', 'pl': 'Uczenie się niewielu ujęć poprzez powiększanie danych kontekstowych', 'mk': 'Мало учење преку зголемување на контекстните податоци', 'ro': 'Învățarea puține fotografii prin mărirea contextuală a datelor', 'sr': 'Malo snimanja učenja kroz pojačanje kontekstualnih podataka', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ දත්ත විශාලනයෙන් පුළුවන් වෙඩි තියාගන්න', 'so': 'Waxbarashada wax yar oo ku saabsan koritaanka macluumaadka joogtada ah', 'ta': 'தற்போதைய தரவு சேர்த்தல் மூலம் கற்றுக் குறைந்த படம்', 'sv': 'Få-skott lärande genom kontextuell dataökning', 'ur': 'کم شٹ سیکھنے کے ذریعہ کنٹکسٹ ڈیٹا اضافہ کے ذریعہ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Ít bắn học qua việc gia tăng dữ liệu', 'bg': 'Малко обучение чрез контекстуално увеличаване на данните', 'hr': 'Malo snimanja učenja kroz povećanje kontekstskih podataka', 'nl': 'Nauwkeurig leren door contextuele data augmentatie', 'da': 'Få-skudt læring gennem kontekstuel dataforøgelse', 'id': 'Beberapa penembakan belajar melalui peningkatan data kontekstual', 'de': 'Weniger-Schuss-Lernen durch kontextbezogene Datenerweiterung', 'ko': '상하문 데이터로 강화된 소량의 렌즈 학습', 'fa': 'یادگیری کمی از طریق افزایش داده های متوسط', 'af': 'Klein-skoot leer deur konteksual data augmentasie', 'sw': 'Kujifunza kwa picha wachache kupitia ongezeko la taarifa za sasa', 'sq': 'Mësimi me pak foto nëpërmjet rritjes së të dhënave kontekstuale', 'tr': 'Kontekst maglumatlary ýetişdirmekden azajyk öwrenmek', 'hy': 'Մի քանի նկարներ սովորելու միջոցով կոնտեքստալ տվյալների աճի միջոցով', 'am': 'የአሁኑ ዳታ ማጠቃለያ', 'bn': 'প্রাক্তন তথ্য যোগাযোগের মাধ্যমে কয়েকটি গুলি শিক্ষা প্রদান করা হচ্ছে', 'az': 'Üstünlük məlumatları artırmaq vasitəsilə az şanslı öyrənmək', 'bs': 'Malo snimanja učenja kroz povećanje kontekstualnih podataka', 'ca': "L'aprenentatge de poques fotos a través del augment de dades contextuals", 'cs': 'Učení s málo záběry prostřednictvím rozšíření kontextových dat', 'fi': 'Vähäinen oppiminen kontekstuaalisen datan lisäämisen avulla', 'et': 'Vähese võimalusega õppimine kontekstuaalsete andmete suurendamise kaudu', 'ha': 'QScriptBreakpointsModel', 'he': 'למידה קטנה דרך גידול נתונים קונטקסטיים', 'sk': 'Malo učenja z okrepitvijo kontekstualnih podatkov', 'jv': 'text-tool-action', 'bo': 'contextual གནས་ཚུལ་ཆེ་རུ་གཏོང་བའི་སྐོར་བརྗོད་ཆེ་བ།'}
{'en': 'Machine translation (MT) models used in industries with constantly changing topics, such as translation or news agencies, need to adapt to new data to maintain their performance over time. Our aim is to teach a pre-trained MT model to translate previously unseen words accurately, based on very few examples. We propose (i) an experimental setup allowing us to simulate novel vocabulary appearing in human-submitted translations, and (ii) corresponding evaluation metrics to compare our approaches. We extend a data augmentation approach using a pretrained language model to create training examples with similar contexts for novel words. We compare different fine-tuning and data augmentation approaches and show that adaptation on the scale of one to five examples is possible. Combining data augmentation with randomly selected training sentences leads to the highest BLEU score and accuracy improvements. Impressively, with only 1 to 5 examples, our model reports better accuracy scores than a reference system trained with on average 313 parallel examples.', 'ar': 'تحتاج نماذج الترجمة الآلية المستخدمة في الصناعات ذات الموضوعات المتغيرة باستمرار ، مثل الترجمة أو وكالات الأنباء ، إلى التكيف مع البيانات الجديدة للحفاظ على أدائها بمرور الوقت. هدفنا هو تعليم نموذج الترجمة الآلية المدرب مسبقًا لترجمة الكلمات غير المرئية مسبقًا بدقة ، استنادًا إلى أمثلة قليلة جدًا. نقترح (1) إعدادًا تجريبيًا يسمح لنا بمحاكاة المفردات الجديدة التي تظهر في الترجمات التي يرسلها الإنسان ، و (2) مقاييس التقييم المقابلة لمقارنة مناهجنا. نقوم بتوسيع نهج زيادة البيانات باستخدام نموذج لغة تم اختباره مسبقًا لإنشاء أمثلة تدريبية ذات سياقات مماثلة للكلمات الجديدة. نحن نقارن مختلف أساليب الضبط الدقيق وزيادة البيانات ونبين أن التكيف على مقياس من واحد إلى خمسة أمثلة ممكنة. يؤدي الجمع بين زيادة البيانات وجمل التدريب المختارة عشوائيًا إلى أعلى درجة في BLEU وتحسينات في الدقة. بشكل مثير للإعجاب ، مع 1 إلى 5 أمثلة فقط ، يُبلغ نموذجنا عن درجات دقة أفضل من نظام مرجعي تم تدريبه بمتوسط 313 مثالاً متوازيًا.', 'pt': 'Os modelos de tradução automática (MT) usados em setores com tópicos em constante mudança, como tradução ou agências de notícias, precisam se adaptar a novos dados para manter seu desempenho ao longo do tempo. Nosso objetivo é ensinar um modelo de TA pré-treinado para traduzir palavras inéditas com precisão, com base em pouquíssimos exemplos. Propomos (i) uma configuração experimental que nos permite simular vocabulário novo que aparece em traduções enviadas por humanos e (ii) métricas de avaliação correspondentes para comparar nossas abordagens. Estendemos uma abordagem de aumento de dados usando um modelo de linguagem pré-treinado para criar exemplos de treinamento com contextos semelhantes para novas palavras. Comparamos diferentes abordagens de ajuste fino e aumento de dados e mostramos que a adaptação na escala de um a cinco exemplos é possível. Combinar o aumento de dados com sentenças de treinamento selecionadas aleatoriamente leva à maior pontuação BLEU e melhorias de precisão. Impressionantemente, com apenas 1 a 5 exemplos, nosso modelo relata pontuações de precisão melhores do que um sistema de referência treinado com uma média de 313 exemplos paralelos.', 'es': 'Los modelos de traducción automática (MT) que se utilizan en sectores con temas en constante cambio, como la traducción o las agencias de noticias, deben adaptarse a los nuevos datos para mantener su rendimiento a lo largo del tiempo. Nuestro objetivo es enseñar un modelo de MT previamente entrenado para traducir palabras nunca antes vistas con precisión, basándonos en muy pocos ejemplos. Proponemos (i) una configuración experimental que nos permita simular vocabulario novedoso que aparece en las traducciones enviadas por humanos, y (ii) las métricas de evaluación correspondientes para comparar nuestros enfoques. Ampliamos un enfoque de aumento de datos mediante un modelo de lenguaje previamente entrenado para crear ejemplos de capacitación con contextos similares para palabras novedosas. Comparamos diferentes enfoques de ajuste y aumento de datos y demostramos que la adaptación en la escala de uno a cinco ejemplos es posible. Combinar el aumento de datos con frases de entrenamiento seleccionadas al azar conduce a la puntuación BLEU más alta y a mejoras de precisión. Sorprendentemente, con solo 1 a 5 ejemplos, nuestro modelo informa mejores puntuaciones de precisión que un sistema de referencia entrenado con un promedio de 313 ejemplos paralelos.', 'fr': "Les modèles de traduction automatique (TA) utilisés dans des secteurs où les sujets changent constamment, tels que les agences de traduction ou de presse, doivent s'adapter aux nouvelles données afin de maintenir leurs performances au fil du temps. Notre objectif est d'enseigner un modèle de TA pré-entraîné pour traduire avec précision des mots inédits, sur la base de très peu d'exemples. Nous proposons (i) une configuration expérimentale nous permettant de simuler un nouveau vocabulaire apparaissant dans les traductions soumises par l'homme, et (ii) des métriques d'évaluation correspondantes pour comparer nos approches. Nous développons une approche d'augmentation des données à l'aide d'un modèle de langage préentraîné afin de créer des exemples de formation avec des contextes similaires pour de nouveaux mots. Nous comparons différentes approches de réglage fin et d'augmentation des données et montrons qu'une adaptation à l'échelle de un à cinq exemples est possible. La combinaison de l'augmentation des données avec des phrases d'entraînement sélectionnées au hasard permet d'obtenir le meilleur score BLEU et d'améliorer la précision. De manière impressionnante, avec seulement 1 à 5 exemples, notre modèle rapporte de meilleurs scores de précision qu'un système de référence formé avec en moyenne 313 exemples parallèles.", 'zh': '其变化之行(如译新闻之司)用之机器翻译 (MT) 应新数,以时推移保其性能。 所向者,教一豫练机器翻译模形,基于少例,准译前所不见之单词。 臣等建议(i)一实验设,许拟见人工提交译中新词汇,及(ii)相应者指标以较吾法。 臣等以预训语言模样广数增强之法,为新单词创有类上下文之示例。 臣等较其微调数增强之法,并明一至五例之规模可也。 以数合随机训练句,可得至BLEU分准确性。 令人印象深远者,惟 1 至 5 一示例,臣等模形告准确度分数高于均用 313 并行示例训练者参之。', 'ja': '機械翻訳（ MT ）モデルは、翻訳やニュースエージェンシーなど、トピックが常に変化する業界で使用されており、時間の経過とともにパフォーマンスを維持するために新しいデータに適応する必要があります。 私たちの目的は、ごく一部の例に基づいて、これまで見られなかった単語を正確に翻訳するための事前にトレーニングされたMTモデルを教えることです。 私たちは、(i)人間が提出した翻訳に現れる新規の語彙をシミュレートすることができる実験的な設定、および(ii)私たちのアプローチを比較するための対応する評価指標を提案します。 私たちは、事前に訓練された言語モデルを使用してデータ拡張アプローチを拡張し、新しい単語のために同様のコンテキストを持つトレーニング例を作成します。 さまざまな微調整およびデータ拡張アプローチを比較し、1〜5例のスケールでの適応が可能であることを示します。 データ増強とランダムに選択されたトレーニング文を組み合わせることで、最高のBLEUスコアと精度の向上につながります。 印象的なことに、1〜5の例だけで、当社のモデルは、平均313の並列例でトレーニングされた参照システムよりも良い精度スコアを報告しています。', 'ru': 'Модели машинного перевода (МП), используемые в отраслях с постоянно меняющимися темами, таких как переводческие или новостные агентства, должны адаптироваться к новым данным для поддержания их производительности с течением времени. Наша цель состоит в том, чтобы научить предварительно обученную модель MT точно переводить ранее невидимые слова, основываясь на очень немногих примерах. Мы предлагаем (i) экспериментальную схему, позволяющую моделировать новый словарный запас, появляющийся в переводах, представленных человеком, и (ii) соответствующие оценочные показатели для сравнения наших подходов. Мы расширяем подход к расширению данных, используя предварительно обученную языковую модель для создания обучающих примеров с аналогичными контекстами для новых слов. Мы сравниваем различные подходы к доработке и расширению данных и показываем, что возможна адаптация в масштабе от одного до пяти примеров. Сочетание увеличения данных со случайно выбранными учебными предложениями приводит к самому высокому баллу BLEU и улучшению точности. Впечатляюще, что только с 1 по 5 примерами наша модель сообщает лучшие оценки точности, чем эталонная система, обученная в среднем с 313 параллельными примерами.', 'hi': 'अनुवाद या समाचार एजेंसियों जैसे लगातार बदलते विषयों के साथ उद्योगों में उपयोग किए जाने वाले मशीन अनुवाद (एमटी) मॉडल को समय के साथ अपने प्रदर्शन को बनाए रखने के लिए नए डेटा के अनुकूल होने की आवश्यकता होती है। हमारा उद्देश्य बहुत कम उदाहरणों के आधार पर पहले से अनदेखी शब्दों का सटीक अनुवाद करने के लिए एक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित एमटी मॉडल सिखाना है। हम (i) एक प्रयोगात्मक सेटअप का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो हमें मानव-प्रस्तुत अनुवादों में दिखाई देने वाली उपन्यास शब्दावली का अनुकरण करने की अनुमति देता है, और (ii) हमारे दृष्टिकोणों की तुलना करने के लिए संबंधित मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक। हम उपन्यास शब्दों के लिए समान संदर्भों के साथ प्रशिक्षण उदाहरण बनाने के लिए एक पूर्वप्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल का उपयोग करके एक डेटा संवर्धन दृष्टिकोण का विस्तार करते हैं। हम विभिन्न ठीक-ट्यूनिंग और डेटा वृद्धि दृष्टिकोणों की तुलना करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि एक से पांच उदाहरणों के पैमाने पर अनुकूलन संभव है। यादृच्छिक रूप से चयनित प्रशिक्षण वाक्यों के साथ डेटा वृद्धि के संयोजन से उच्चतम BLEU स्कोर और सटीकता में सुधार होता है। प्रभावशाली रूप से, केवल 1 से 5 उदाहरणों के साथ, हमारा मॉडल औसत 313 समानांतर उदाहरणों के साथ प्रशिक्षित संदर्भ प्रणाली की तुलना में बेहतर सटीकता स्कोर की रिपोर्ट करता है।', 'ga': 'Ní mór do mhúnlaí aistrithe meaisín (MT) a úsáidtear i dtionscail a bhfuil topaicí a bhíonn de shíor ag athrú, mar ghníomhaireachtaí aistriúcháin nó nuachta, oiriúnú do shonraí nua chun a bhfeidhmíocht a choinneáil le himeacht ama. Tá sé mar aidhm againn múnla MT réamh-oilte a mhúineadh chun focail nach bhfacthas riamh cheana a aistriú go cruinn, bunaithe ar fíorbheagán samplaí. Molaimid (i) socrú turgnamhach a cheadaíonn dúinn insamhladh a dhéanamh ar stór focal úrnua atá le feiceáil in aistriúcháin arna gcur isteach ag an duine, agus (ii) méadracht mheastóireachta chomhfhreagrach chun ár gcur chuige a chur i gcomparáid. Leathnaímid cur chuige méadaithe sonraí ag baint úsáide as múnla teanga réamh-oilte chun samplaí oiliúna a chruthú le comhthéacsanna comhchosúla d’fhocail nua. Déanaimid comparáid idir cineálacha cur chuige mionchoigeartaithe agus méadaithe sonraí agus léirímid gur féidir oiriúnú ar scála ó aon go cúig shampla. Má chomhcheanglaítear méadú sonraí le habairtí oiliúna a roghnaítear go randamach, beidh an scór BLEU is airde agus feabhsuithe cruinnis ann. Go hiontach, gan ach 1 go 5 shampla, tuairiscíonn ár múnla scóir chruinneas níos fearr ná córas tagartha atá oilte le 313 sampla comhthreomhar ar an meán.', 'el': 'Τα μοντέλα μηχανικής μετάφρασης (ΜΤ) που χρησιμοποιούνται σε βιομηχανίες με συνεχώς μεταβαλλόμενα θέματα, όπως μεταφραστικά γραφεία ή πρακτορεία ειδήσεων, πρέπει να προσαρμοστούν σε νέα δεδομένα για να διατηρήσουν την απόδοσή τους με την πάροδο του χρόνου. Στόχος μας είναι να διδάξουμε ένα προ-εκπαιδευμένο μοντέλο ΜΤ να μεταφράζει με ακρίβεια λέξεις που δεν έχουν δει προηγουμένως, με βάση πολύ λίγα παραδείγματα. Προτείνουμε (i) μια πειραματική ρύθμιση που μας επιτρέπει να προσομοιώσουμε νέο λεξιλόγιο που εμφανίζεται σε μεταφράσεις που υποβλήθηκαν από άνθρωπο, και (ii) αντίστοιχες μετρήσεις αξιολόγησης για να συγκρίνουμε τις προσεγγίσεις μας. Επεκτείνουμε μια προσέγγιση αύξησης δεδομένων χρησιμοποιώντας ένα προκαθορισμένο γλωσσικό μοντέλο για να δημιουργήσουμε παραδείγματα κατάρτισης με παρόμοια πλαίσια για νέες λέξεις. Συγκρίνουμε διαφορετικές προσεγγίσεις συντονισμού και αύξησης δεδομένων και δείχνουμε ότι η προσαρμογή στην κλίμακα ενός έως πέντε παραδειγμάτων είναι δυνατή. Ο συνδυασμός αύξησης δεδομένων με τυχαία επιλεγμένες προτάσεις εκπαίδευσης οδηγεί στην υψηλότερη βαθμολογία και βελτιώσεις ακρίβειας. Εντυπωσιακό, με μόνο 1 έως 5 παραδείγματα, το μοντέλο μας αναφέρει καλύτερες βαθμολογίες ακρίβειας από ένα σύστημα αναφοράς εκπαιδευμένο με κατά μέσο όρο 313 παράλληλα παραδείγματα.', 'hu': 'A folyamatosan változó témákkal rendelkező iparágakban, például fordítóirodákban vagy hírügynökségekben használt gépi fordítási modelleknek alkalmazkodniuk kell az új adatokhoz, hogy teljesítményük idővel fenntartható legyen. Célunk, hogy egy előre képzett MT modellt tanítsunk a korábban láthatatlan szavak pontos lefordítására, nagyon kevés példa alapján. Javasoljuk (i) egy kísérleti beállítást, amely lehetővé teszi számunkra, hogy szimuláljuk az ember által benyújtott fordításokban megjelenő új szókincseket, és (ii) a megfelelő értékelési mutatókat a megközelítéseink összehasonlítására. Az adatbővítési megközelítést egy előképzett nyelvi modell segítségével bővítjük ki, hogy hasonló kontextusú képzési példákat hozzunk létre új szavakhoz. Összehasonlítjuk a különböző finomhangolási és adatbővítési megközelítéseket, és megmutatjuk, hogy az alkalmazkodás lehetséges egytől öt példáig. Az adatbővítés és a véletlenszerűen kiválasztott edzési mondatok kombinációja a legmagasabb BLEU pontszámot és a pontosság javítását eredményezi. Lenyűgöző, hogy mindössze 1-5 példával modellünk jobb pontossági pontszámokat jelent, mint egy átlagosan 313 párhuzamos példával képzett referencia rendszer.', 'it': "I modelli di traduzione automatica (MT) utilizzati in settori in continua evoluzione, come le agenzie di traduzione o di stampa, devono adattarsi ai nuovi dati per mantenere le loro prestazioni nel tempo. Il nostro obiettivo è quello di insegnare un modello MT pre-addestrato per tradurre con precisione parole precedentemente invisibili, sulla base di pochissimi esempi. Proponiamo (i) una configurazione sperimentale che ci permette di simulare il vocabolario nuovo che appare nelle traduzioni inviate dall'uomo, e (ii) metriche di valutazione corrispondenti per confrontare i nostri approcci. Estendiamo un approccio di data augmentation utilizzando un modello linguistico pre-addestrato per creare esempi di formazione con contesti simili per parole novelle. Confrontiamo diversi approcci di fine-tuning e data augmentation e mostriamo che è possibile un adattamento sulla scala da uno a cinque esempi. Combinare l'aumento dei dati con frasi di allenamento selezionate casualmente porta al punteggio BLEU più alto e ai miglioramenti della precisione. Sorprendentemente, con solo 1-5 esempi, il nostro modello riporta punteggi di precisione migliori rispetto a un sistema di riferimento formato con in media 313 esempi paralleli.", 'ka': 'მაქსინური გაგრძელება (MT) მოდელები, რომლებიც სამუშაოდ გაცვლებული ტემებით, როგორც გაგრძელება ან ახალგაზომის ადგინტებით, უნდა ახალი მონაცემებისთვის აეპორტირე ჩვენი მიზეზი არის დავისწავლოთ წინ არაჩვენებული სიტყვები, ძალიან რამდენიმე მაგალითად გადასწავლობა. ჩვენ მინდა i) ექსპერიმენტიური დასრულება, რომელიც ჩვენ შეგვიძლია სიმულაცია პრომენტიური სიტყვებულები, რომელიც ადამიანის გადასრულებულია, და ii) შესაბამისი გადასრულებული მეტრიკები ჩვენ მონაცემების აგგენტირების მიღება, რომელიც პრომენტის სიტყვებისთვის გამოყენებული ენის მოდელის გამოყენება, რომ შექმნა განაკეთებული მაგალითების მაგალითი ჩვენ განსხვავებული კონფიგურაციის და მონაცემების აგგენტაციის შესახებ და ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ერთი-ხუთი მაგალითად ადატაცია შესაძლებელია. მონაცემების აზექტირება მონაცემებით გამოიყენებული აზექტირებულად გამოიყენებული აზექტირებულად გამოყენებული აზექტირებულია, რომელიც უფრო დი მხოლოდ 1-5 მაგალითად ჩვენი მოდელის შეტყობინება უფრო მსგავსი წარმოდგენება, ვიდრე რეფერენციის სისტემის განსწავლებული საშუალოდ 313 პარალელი მაგალითად.', 'kk': 'Аудару не жаңалық құрылғылар секілдерінде қолданылатын машиналық аудару (MT) моделдері, мысалы, аудару не жаңалық құрылғылар секілді, уақыт бойынша жұмыс істеу үшін жаңа деректерге адаптау Біздің мақсатымыз - өткен мәселелерді дұрыс көрсетілмеген сөздерді, өте кейбір мысалдардан негізделген MT үлгісін оқыту. Біз (i) тәжірибелі орнатуды, адамдардың аудармаларында көрсетілген жаңа сөздерді симуляциялауға мүмкіндік береді, және (ii) біздің жағдайларымызды салыстыру үшін сәйкес келетін мәтіндік метри Біз деректерді жақсарту арқылы романдық сөздер үшін ұқсас мәселелерді жасау үшін әртүрлі тіл үлгісін қолдануға болады. Біз бір-бірінен бес мысалдардың масштабына адаптациялау мүмкіндігін көрсету және мәліметтерді баптау және деректерді көтеру жағдайларын салыстырып көрсету мү Деректерді кездейсоқ таңдалған оқыту сөйлемелерімен біріктіру үшін ең жоғары BLEU нәтижесін және дұрыс жақсарту үшін болады. Біздің үлгілеріміздің түсініктеріміз, орташа 313 параллель мысалдардан бақылатын сілтеме жүйесіне сәйкестік нәтижелерді жақсы түсіндіреді.', 'ms': 'Machine translation (MT) models used in industries with constantly changing topics, such as translation or news agencies, need to adapt to new data to maintain their performance over time.  Tujuan kita ialah mengajar model MT terlatih untuk menerjemahkan perkataan yang belum terlihat sebelumnya dengan tepat, berdasarkan beberapa contoh. Kami cadangkan (i) seting percubaan yang membolehkan kita simulasikan vokbulari baru yang muncul dalam terjemahan-dihantar manusia, dan (ii) metrik penilaian yang sepadan untuk membandingkan pendekatan kita. We extend a data augmentation approach using a pretrained language model to create training examples with similar contexts for novel words.  Kami membandingkan penyesuaian yang berbeza dan pendekatan peningkatan data dan menunjukkan bahawa penyesuaian pada skala satu hingga lima contoh adalah mungkin. Menggabungkan peningkatan data dengan kalimat latihan terpilih secara rawak mengarah ke skor BLEU tertinggi dan peningkatan akurat. Secara mengesankan, dengan hanya 1 hingga 5 contoh, model kami melaporkan skor ketepatan yang lebih baik daripada sistem rujukan dilatih dengan rata-rata 313 contoh selari.', 'ml': 'നിരന്തരമായി മാറ്റുന്ന പ്രമേയങ്ങള്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതോടൊപ്പം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ (MT) മോഡലുകള്\u200d, ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d, പരിഭാഷ നമ്മുടെ ലക്ഷ്യം മുമ്പ് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട എംടി മോഡല്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് മുമ്പ് അദൃശ്യമായ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ശരിയായ നമ്മള്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പരീക്ഷണസജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുന്ന നോവല്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d സിമിലേറ്റ് ചെയ്യാന We extend a data augmentation approach using a pretrained language model to create training examples with similar contexts for novel words.  നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത സുന്ദരിക്കുന്നതിനെയും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂട്ടുന്നതിനെയും തുല്യമാക്കുന്നതിനെയും താരതമ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നു.  തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ട്രെയിനിങ്ങളുടെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ഡേറ്റാ കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു അത്യാവശ്യത്തില്\u200d, 1 മുതല്\u200d 5 ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d മാത്രമേ ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നുള്ളൂ സ്കോര്\u200dട്ട് മെച്ചപ്പെട്', 'lt': 'Vertimo mašinomis (MT) modeliai, naudojami pramonės šakose, kuriose nuolat kinta tema, pvz., vertimo ar naujienų agentūros, turi prisitaikyti prie naujų duomenų, kad laikui bėgant išliktų jų veiklos rezultatai. Our aim is to teach a pre-trained MT model to translate previously unseen words accurately, based on very few examples.  Siūlome i) eksperimentinę struktūrą, leidži an či ą mums simuliuoti naują žodyną, esantį žmogaus pateiktuose vertimuose, ir ii) atitinkamas vertinimo metrijas, kad palygintume mūsų metodus. Mes išplečiame duomenų didinimo metodą naudojant iš anksto parengtą kalbos model į, kad sukurtume mokymo pavyzdžius su panašiais naujų žodžių kontekstais. Palyginame skirtingus patobulinimo ir duomenų didinimo metodus ir parodome, kad galima pritaikyti nuo vieno iki penkių pavyzdžių mastą. Duomenų didinimas kartu su atsitiktinai atrinktais mokymo sakiniais lemia didžiausią BLEU rezultatą ir tikslumą. Įspūdinga, kad su tik 1–5 pavyzdžiais mūsų modelis pateikia geresnius tikslumo rezultatus nei su orientacine sistema, kuri buvo parengta vidutiniškai 313 lygiagrečiais pavyzdžiais.', 'mn': 'Машин хөрөнгө оруулалт (MT) загварууд нь салбарт үргэлж өөрчлөгдөж байгаа сэтгэл санаануудтай хэрэглэгддэг. Жишээ нь хөрөнгө оруулалт, мэдээллийн агентлагууд шинэ өгөгдлийг цаг хугацаанд ажиллах Бидний зорилго бол өмнө нь харагдаагүй үгсийг тодорхой орлуулахын тулд сургалтын MT загвар заах юм. Бид (i) туршилтын төлөвлөгөө нь хүн төрөлхтний дамжуулагдсан шинэ үгийг шинэчлэх боломжтой болгодог бөгөөд (ii) бидний ойлголтыг харьцуулахын тулд холбоотой дүгнэлтийн метрикийг санал болгодог. Бид өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэлтийн арга загварыг шинэ үгсийн төвшинд төстэй байдлаар суралцах жишээ бий болгоход нэмэгдүүлдэг. Бид өөр төрлийн тодорхойлолт болон өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэлтийг харьцуулж, нэгээс таван жишээ дээр адаптацийг харуулж болно. Өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэлт санамсаргүй сонголт өгүүлбэртэй холбогдох нь хамгийн өндөр BLEU оноо болон зөв сайжруулалт руу хүргэж байна. Гайхалтай нь, зөвхөн 1-5 жишээнээс бидний загварын тодорхойлолт нь дундаж 313 параллел жишээнээс илүү зөв тодорхойлолтой байдаг.', 'no': 'Modellar for maskinsomsetjing (MT) som vert brukt i industriar med kontinuerleg endring av emne, som omsetjing eller nyhetsgjenester, må tilpassa nye data for å oppretta utviklinga sine over tid. Målet vårt er å læra eit føretrained MT-modell for å oversette tidlegare ukjende ord akkurat, basert på svært få eksemplar. Vi foreslår i) ein eksperimentell oppsett som tillater oss å simulere nytt ordbok som dukkar opp i menneskelige oversettelsar, og ii) tilsvarande evalueringsmetrikar for å sammenligne tilnærmingane våre. Vi utvidar ein dataaugmentasjonstilnærming ved å bruka eit språk-modell for å laga øvingseksemplar med liknande kontekstar for novel ord. Vi samanliknar ulike tilnærmingar for fin-tuning og data-augmentasjon og viser at tilpassing på skala av ein til fem eksemplar er mogleg. Kombinering av data med tilfeldig valde øvingssetningar fører til dei høgste BLEU-poeng og nøyaktighetsforbetringane. Berre 1 til 5 eksemplar rapporterer modellen våre betre nøyaktighetspoeng enn eit referansystem trengt med gjennomsnittlig 313 parallelle eksemplar.', 'mk': 'Машински преведувачки (МТ) модели кои се користат во индустриите со постојано се менуваат теми, како што се преведувачките или новинските агенции, мора да се адаптираат на новите податоци за да ја одржат нивната резултатност со текот на времето Нашата цел е да научиме предобучен модел на МТ за преведување претходно невидени зборови точно, врз основа на многу малку примери. Ние предложуваме (i) експериментална поставка која ни овозможува да симулираме нов зборник кој се појавува во преводи поднесени од човекот, и (ii) соодветни метрики за евалуација за споредба на нашите пристапи. Ние го прошируваме пристапот на зголемување на податоците користејќи предобучен јазички модел за да создадеме примери за обука со слични контексти за нови зборови. Ние ги споредуваме различните пристапи на финетизирање и зголемување на податоците и покажуваме дека адаптацијата на скалата од еден до пет примери е можна. Combining data augmentation with randomly selected training sentences leads to the highest BLEU score and accuracy improvements.  Импресивно, со само 1 до 5 примери, нашиот модел известува подобри точности отколку референциски систем обучен со просечно 313 паралелни примери.', 'pl': 'Modele tłumaczenia maszynowego (MT) stosowane w branżach o stale zmieniających się tematach, takich jak agencje tłumaczeń czy informacyjne, muszą dostosowywać się do nowych danych, aby utrzymać swoją wydajność w czasie. Naszym celem jest nauczenie wstępnie przeszkolonego modelu MT, aby dokładnie tłumaczyć niewidziane wcześniej słowa, na podstawie bardzo niewielu przykładów. Proponujemy (i) konfigurację eksperymentalną pozwalającą na symulację nowego słownictwa pojawiającego się w tłumaczeniach przesłanych przez człowieka oraz (ii) odpowiednie wskaźniki oceny do porównania naszych podejść. Rozszerzamy podejście do powiększania danych wykorzystując wstępnie przeszkolony model językowy, aby tworzyć przykłady treningowe o podobnych kontekstach dla nowych słów. Porównujemy różne metody dostrajania i powiększania danych i pokazujemy, że dostosowanie do skali od jednego do pięciu przykładów jest możliwe. Połączenie powiększania danych z losowo dobranymi zdaniami treningowymi prowadzi do najwyższego wyniku BLEU i poprawy dokładności. Imponujące jest, że dzięki tylko przykładom od 1 do pięciu, nasz model odnotowuje lepsze wyniki dokładności niż system referencyjny przeszkolony na średnio równoległych przykładach 313.', 'ro': 'Modelele de traducere automată (MT) utilizate în industrii cu subiecte în continuă schimbare, cum ar fi agențiile de traducere sau de știri, trebuie să se adapteze la noile date pentru a-și menține performanța în timp. Scopul nostru este de a preda un model MT pre-instruit pentru a traduce cuvinte nevăzute anterior cu precizie, bazat pe foarte puține exemple. Propunem (i) o configurație experimentală care ne permite să simulăm vocabularul nou care apare în traducerile trimise de om și (ii) măsuri de evaluare corespunzătoare pentru a compara abordările noastre. Extindem o abordare de augmentare a datelor folosind un model lingvistic pre-instruit pentru a crea exemple de formare cu contexte similare pentru cuvinte noi. Comparăm diferite abordări de reglare fină și de mărire a datelor și arătăm că este posibilă adaptarea la scara unu până la cinci exemple. Combinarea măririi datelor cu propoziții de instruire selectate aleatoriu duce la cel mai mare scor BLEU și îmbunătățiri de precizie. Impresionant, cu doar 1 până la 5 exemple, modelul nostru raportează scoruri de precizie mai bune decât un sistem de referință instruit cu în medie 313 exemple paralele.', 'sr': 'Modeli automatskog prevoda (MT) koji se koriste u industriji sa stalno mijenjanjem tema, kao što su prevoditelji ili novinske agencije, moraju se prilagoditi novim podacima kako bi održali svoju izvedbu tokom vremena. Naš cilj je naučiti predobučeni MT model da prevodi prethodno nevidjene reči tačno, na osnovu vrlo malo primjera. Predlažemo i) eksperimentalnu ustanovu koja nam omogućava da simuliramo novi rečnik koji se pojavljuje u ljudskim prevodima, i ii) odgovarajuće mjere procjene da usporedimo naše pristupe. Povećavamo pristup povećanja podataka koristeći pretrenirani jezički model kako bi stvorili primjere obuke sa sličnim kontekstima za nove reči. Uspoređujemo različite pristupe prilagođavanja fino-tuning i povećanja podataka i pokazujemo da je moguće adaptacija na skali 1-5 primjera. Kombinacija povećanja podataka sa nasumično izabranim kaznama za obuku vodi do najvišeg rezultata BLEU-a i poboljšanja tačnosti. Impresivno, sa samo 1 do 5 primjera, naši modeli izvještavaju bolje tačnosti nego referentni sistem koji je obučen prosječnim 313 paralelnim primjerima.', 'si': 'මැෂින් අවවාදය (MT) මොඩේල් ප්\u200dරදේශයේ විදිහට වෙනස් වෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට භාවිත කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට, වගේම අවවාදය නැත අපේ අරමුණ තමයි ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු MT මොඩේල් එකක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට අවධානය කරපු වචන සිද්ධ විදිහට අව අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් (i) ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සැකසුම් කරන්න පුළුවන් අපිට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් විවෘත ශබ්ද වාර්තාවක් මිනිස්සුන්ගේ අව අපි දත්ත විශාලනයක් විස්තර කරනවා ප්\u200dරීට්\u200dරේන්ඩ් භාෂා මොඩේලයක් භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරනවා සම අපි වෙනස් විදිහට සුදුසුම් සහ දත්ත විශාලනය සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සහ පෙන්වන්නේ එක්කෙන දත්ත විශාලනය සම්බන්ධ විශාලනය සමඟ අවස්ථාවක් තෝරාගෙන තෝරාගෙන තෝරාගෙන ඉන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තිය සුභ ප්\u200dරශ්ණයි, උදාහරණ පමණ පමණ පමණ පමණ පමණ පමණින්, අපේ මොඩල් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හරියටම සාමාන්\u200dය හරියට හරියට හර', 'sv': 'Maskin철vers채ttningsmodeller (MT) som anv채nds i branscher med st채ndigt f철r채nderliga 채mnen, som 철vers채ttnings- eller nyhetsbyr책er, m책ste anpassas till nya data f철r att bibeh책lla sin prestanda 철ver tid. V책rt m책l 채r att l채ra en f채rdigutbildad MT-modell att 철vers채tta tidigare osynliga ord korrekt, baserat p책 mycket f책 exempel. Vi f철resl책r (i) en experimentell konfiguration som g철r det m철jligt f철r oss att simulera nya vokabul채r som visas i m채nskliga-inl채mnade 철vers채ttningar, och (ii) motsvarande utv채rderingsmetoder f철r att j채mf철ra v책ra tillv채gag책ngss채tt. Vi ut철kar en dataf철rst채rkning med hj채lp av en f철rkr채nad spr책kmodell f철r att skapa utbildningsexempel med liknande sammanhang f철r nya ord. Vi j채mf철r olika finjusterings- och dataaugmentationsmetoder och visar att anpassning i skala fr책n ett till fem exempel 채r m철jlig. Kombinationen av dataf철rst채rkning med slumpm채ssigt utvalda tr채ningsmeningar leder till h철gsta BLEU-po채ng och noggrannhetsf철rb채ttringar. Imponerande, med endast 1 till 5 exempel, rapporterar v책r modell b채ttre noggrannhetspo채ng 채n ett referenssystem utbildad med i genomsnitt 313 parallella exempel.', 'so': "Tusaalada turjumidda mashiinka (MT) ee lagu isticmaali karo shirkadaha lagu beddelayo maadooyin joogtada ah, tusaale ahaan turjumista ama hay'adaha warbixinta, waa in loo beddelaa macluumaad cusub si ay u ilaaliyaan sameynta sameynta waqtiga badan. Ujeedkeennu waa in lagu baro model MT ah oo horay loo tababaray si saxda ah ugu turjumo erayo aan la aqoon, tusaalooyin yar oo ku saleysan. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa qoraal imtixaan ah oo ina sameynaya qoraalka warqadda ah oo ka soo muuqata turjumidda dadka la soo dhiibay iyo (i i) metriciyada qiimeynta oo u eg inay is barbardhigto qaababkayaga. Dhaqdhaqaaqa koritaanka ee macluumaadka waxaynu ku fidinaynaa tusaale ahaan afka hore, si aan u sameyno tusaalooyin waxbarasho oo la mid ah hadallada saxda ah. Waxaannu isbarbardhignaa barwaaqo kala duduwan iyo kordhinta macluumaadka, waxaana tusnaynaa in isku beddelasho isku mid-shan tusaalooyin suurtagal ah. Ku soo koritaanka macluumaadka si fudud loogu talagalay hadallada waxbarashada oo la doortay waxay ku socotaa scorada ugu sarreeya BLEU iyo horumarinta saxda ah. Si wanaagsan, tusaale ahaan oo kaliya 1-5 tusaale ahaan, modellkayagu wuxuu wargeliyaa qiimaha saxda ah oo ka wanaagsan nidaamka reference ee lagu baray tusaale ahaan ugu dhexeeya 313.", 'ta': 'Machine translation (MT) models used in industries with constantly changing topics, such as translation or news agencies, need to adapt to new data to maintain their performance over time.  எங்கள் இலக்கு முன் பயிற்சி முறைமையான MT மாதிரியை கற்றுக்கொடுக்கும் சில உதாரணங்களை அடிப்படையில் மொழிபெயர் நாம் (நான்) ஒரு சோதனையின் அமைப்பு மனித மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் தெரியும் புதிய சொல்வளத்தை ஒப்பிட அனுமதிக்க அனுமதிக்கிறது, மற்றும் (i i) ஒப்பிடும் மதிப நாம் புதிய வார்த்தைகளுக்கு போன்ற பயிற்சி உதாரணங்களை உருவாக்க ஒரு தரவு கூட்டுதல் முறைமையை பயன்படுத்தி ஒரு மொழ நாம் வேறு வித்திய நன்மைகளை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் தரவு அதிகரிப்பு நெருக்கங்களை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் ஒரு அல்லது ஐ குறிப்பில்லாத தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட பயிற்சி வாக்கியங்களுடன் தரவு சேர்ப்பு சேர்த்தல் அதிக பிலியு மதிப்புகள 1^5 உதாரணங்கள் மட்டும் இருந்தால், எங்கள் மாதிரி அறிக்கையில் சரியான மதிப்பெண்களை விட மேலும் சரியான மதிப்பெண்கள் அறிக்க', 'ur': 'مشین ترجمہ (MT) موڈل جو مصنعت میں ہمیشہ تغییر کرنے کے ساتھ استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں، جیسے ترجمہ یا نیویس ایجنسیٹ، ان کی عملکرد کو وقت پر قائم رکھنے کے لئے نو ڈیٹا کے ساتھ اضافہ کرنے کی ضرورت ہے. ہمارا مقصد یہ ہے کہ پہلے غیب کی باتوں کو دقیق ترجمہ کرنے کے لئے ایک ٹی ٹی موڈل سکھائے۔ ہم نے (i) ایک آزمائش سٹاپ کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جو ہمیں نئی آزمائش لکھنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے جو انسان کے تحویل دیئے گئے ترجمہ میں ظاہر ہوتی ہے اور (ii) ہماری طریقوں کے مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق ہے۔ ہم نے ایک ڈیٹا اضافہ کا طریقہ تقسیم کرتا ہے تارین کلمات کے لئے مثالیں پیدا کرنے کے لئے ایک زیادہ زیادہ زبان کی مدل کے مطابق۔ ہم مختلف طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح ڈیٹا اضافہ کرنا نافذ طور پر انتخاب کیا گیا ترینس جماعت کے ساتھ سب سے بالاترین بلیوس اسکور اور دقیق اضافہ کی جاتی ہے. صرف 1 تا 5 مثال کے ساتھ ہمارے موڈل راپورٹ سے بہتر دقیق اسکورٹ سے بہتر ہے جو متوسط 313 مثال پر آموزش کی گئی ہے.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli tat-traduzzjoni bil-magna (MT) użati f’industriji b’suġġetti li jinbidlu b’mod kostanti, bħat-traduzzjoni jew l-aġenziji tal-aħbarijiet, jeħtieġu jadattaw għal dejta ġdida biex iżommu l-prestazzjoni tagħhom maż-żmien. L-għan tagħna huwa li tagħlim mudell MT imħarreġ minn qabel biex jittraduċi kliem li ma dehrux qabel b’mod pre ċiż, ibbażat fuq ftit eżempji. Aħna nipproponu (i) struttura sperimentali li tippermettilna nissimulaw vokabulari ġdid li jidher fit-traduzzjonijiet sottomessi mill-bniedem, u (ii) metriċi ta’ evalwazzjoni korrispondenti biex tqabblu l-approċċi tagħna. We extend a data augmentation approach using a pretrained language model to create training examples with similar contexts for novel words.  We compare different fine-tuning and data augmentation approaches and show that adaptation on the scale of one to five examples is possible.  Combining data augmentation with randomly selected training sentences leads to the highest BLEU score and accuracy improvements.  B’mod impressjonanti, b’eżempju wieħed sa ħames biss, il-mudell tagħna jirrapporta punteġġi ta’ preċiżjoni a ħjar minn sistema ta’ referenza mħarrġa b’medja ta’ 313 eżempju parallel.', 'uz': "Name Bizning maqsadimiz oldin o'rganilgan MT modelini o'rganish uchun oldin nomaʼlum so'zlarni juda kam misol asosida tarjima qilish mumkin. Biz tasavvur qilamiz, biz inson tarjima qiladigan vositalarni kamaytirish imkoniyatlariga ruxsat beramiz va (i i) murakkablarimizni kamaytirish uchun qiymati metrikalarni o'xshash qilamiz. Biz taʼminlovchi tilni foydalanish uchun taʼminlovchi misollarni yangi so'zlar uchun o'xshash taʼminlovchilar yaratish mumkin. Biz boshqa suhbat tuzilishini kamaytamiz va maʼlumot qo'shish usullarini ko'rsatumiz va bir yoki besh misollarda o'xshash mumkin. Combining data augmentation with randomly selected training sentences leads to the highest BLEU score and accuracy improvements.  Muhimlik, faqat 1 to 5 misollar bilan modelmiz esa faqat 313 parallel misollari bilan o'rganilgan reference tizimdan yaxshi aniqlash imkoniyatini tahrirlaydi.", 'vi': 'Cơ chế dịch biến hình (MTV) được sử dụng trong các công ty với các chủ đề liên tục thay đổi, như dịch hay các hãng thông tin, cần phải thích nghi với dữ liệu mới để duy trì hiệu suất theo thời gian. Mục tiêu của chúng ta là dạy một mô hình MTV được huấn luyện để dịch chính xác những từ không ai thấy trước đây, dựa trên rất ít ví dụ. Chúng tôi đề xuất: i) một thiết lập thử nghiệm cho phép chúng tôi mô phỏng các từ mới xuất hiện trong bản dịch được gửi người, và (II) các âm lượng đánh giá tương ứng để so sánh phương pháp của chúng tôi. Chúng tôi mở rộng phương pháp gia tăng dữ liệu sử dụng một mô hình ngôn ngữ sẵn sàng để tạo ví dụ về huấn luyện tương tự cho những từ mới. Chúng tôi so sánh các phương pháp nghiên cứu và gia tăng dữ liệu khác nhau và cho thấy có khả năng thích nghi trên quy mô của một đến năm ví dụ. Kết hợp việc gia tăng dữ liệu với các câu huấn luyện ngẫu nhiên đã được chọn dẫn đến tỉ số nhảy thoát hiểm cao nhất và cải tiến độ chính xác. Thật ấn tượng, chỉ với một ví dụ 1-5, mẫu của chúng ta báo cáo độ chính xác cao hơn một hệ thống tham khảo được huấn luyện theo giá trung bình 313 trường song.', 'bg': 'Моделите за машинен превод (МТ), използвани в индустрии с постоянно променящи се теми, като например преводачески или новинарски агенции, трябва да се адаптират към новите данни, за да поддържат ефективността си във времето. Нашата цел е да научим предварително обучен модел за превод на невиждани преди това думи точно, въз основа на много малко примери. Предлагаме (и) експериментална настройка, която ни позволява да симулираме нов речник, появяващ се в преводи, изпратени от хора, и (ii) съответстващи показатели за оценка, за да сравним нашите подходи. Разширяваме подхода за увеличаване на данните, използвайки предварително обучен езиков модел, за да създадем примери за обучение с подобни контексти за нови думи. Сравняваме различни подходи за фино настройване и увеличаване на данните и показваме, че адаптацията по скалата от един до пет примера е възможна. Комбинирането на увеличаване на данните с произволно избрани тренировъчни изречения води до най-висок резултат и подобрения на точността. Впечатляващо е, че само с 1 до 5 примера нашият модел отчита по-добри оценки за точност от референтна система, обучена със средно 313 паралелни примера.', 'da': 'Maskinoversættelsesmodeller, der anvendes i brancher med konstant skiftende emner, såsom oversættelses- eller nyhedsbureauer, skal tilpasse sig nye data for at bevare deres ydeevne over tid. Vores mål er at lære en forududdannet MT model til at oversætte tidligere usete ord præcist, baseret på meget få eksempler. Vi foreslår (i) en eksperimentel opsætning, der giver os mulighed for at simulere nyt ordforråd, der vises i menneskeindsendte oversættelser, og (ii) tilsvarende evalueringsmetrics til at sammenligne vores tilgange. Vi udvider en dataaugmentation tilgang ved hjælp af en forudtrænet sprogmodel til at skabe træningseksempler med lignende sammenhænge for nye ord. Vi sammenligner forskellige finjusterings- og dataaugmentationstilgange og viser, at tilpasning på skala fra et til fem eksempler er mulig. Kombinationen af dataforøgelse med tilfældigt udvalgte træningssætninger fører til den højeste BLEU score og nøjagtighedsforbedringer. Imponerende med kun 1 til 5 eksempler rapporterer vores model bedre præcisionsscorer end et referencesystem uddannet med i gennemsnit 313 parallelle eksempler.', 'nl': 'Machine Translation (MT)-modellen die worden gebruikt in industrieën met voortdurend veranderende onderwerpen, zoals vertaal- of nieuwsbureaus, moeten zich aanpassen aan nieuwe gegevens om hun prestaties in de loop van de tijd te behouden. Ons doel is om een vooraf getraind MT-model te leren om voorheen ongeziene woorden nauwkeurig te vertalen, op basis van zeer weinig voorbeelden. We stellen (i) een experimentele opstelling voor waarmee we nieuwe woordenschat kunnen simuleren die voorkomt in door mensen ingediende vertalingen, en (ii) corresponderende evaluatiestatistieken om onze benaderingen te vergelijken. We breiden een data augmentatie benadering uit met behulp van een vooraf getraind taalmodel om trainingsvoorbeelden te creëren met vergelijkbare contexten voor nieuwe woorden. We vergelijken verschillende fine-tuning en data augmentatie benaderingen en laten zien dat aanpassing op schaal van één tot vijf voorbeelden mogelijk is. Het combineren van data augmentatie met willekeurig geselecteerde trainingszinnen leidt tot de hoogste BLEU score en nauwkeurigheidsverbeteringen. Indrukwekkend is dat ons model met slechts 1 tot 5 voorbeelden betere nauwkeurigheidsscores rapporteert dan een referentiesysteem dat getraind is met gemiddeld 313 parallelle voorbeelden.', 'hr': 'Moraju se prilagoditi novim podacima kako bi održali svoj učinkovit tijekom vremena. Naš cilj je naučiti predobučeni MT model da prevodi prethodno nevidjene riječi tačno, na temelju vrlo malo primjera. Predlažemo i) eksperimentalnu ustanovu koja nam omogućava simulirati nov riječ koji se pojavljuje u ljudskim prevodima, i ii) odgovarajuće mjere procjene kako bismo usporedili naše pristupe. Povećavamo pristup povećanjem podataka koristeći pretrenirani jezički model kako bi stvorili primjere obuke sa sličnim kontekstima za nove riječi. Uspoređujemo različite pristupe prilagođavanja lijekova i povećanja podataka i pokazujemo da je moguće prilagođavanje na skali jedne do pet primjera. Povećanje podataka sa slučajno izabranim kaznama za obuku vodi do najvišeg poboljšanja BLEU rezultata i preciznosti. Impresivno, sa samo 1 do 5 primjera, naši modeli izvještavaju bolje tačnosti nego referentni sustav obučen prosječnim 313 paralelnim primjerima.', 'id': 'Model terjemahan mesin (MT) yang digunakan dalam industri dengan topik yang terus berubah, seperti terjemahan atau agensi berita, perlu beradaptasi dengan data baru untuk mempertahankan prestasi mereka melalui waktu. Tujuan kami adalah mengajar model MT yang terlatih untuk menerjemahkan kata-kata yang belum terlihat sebelumnya dengan tepat, berdasarkan beberapa contoh. Kami mengusulkan (i) seting eksperimen yang memungkinkan kita untuk simulasi vokbulari baru yang muncul dalam terjemahan-dikirim manusia, dan (ii) metrik evaluasi yang sesuai untuk membandingkan pendekatan kita. Kami memperluas pendekatan peningkatan data menggunakan model bahasa yang dilatih sebelumnya untuk menciptakan contoh pelatihan dengan konteks yang sama untuk kata-kata baru. Kita membandingkan penyesuaian dan pendekatan peningkatan data yang berbeda dan menunjukkan bahwa adaptasi pada skala dari satu sampai lima contoh mungkin. Kombinasi peningkatan data dengan kalimat latihan terpilih secara acak menyebabkan skor BLEU tertinggi dan peningkatan akurasi. Mengesankan, dengan hanya 1 sampai 5 contoh, model kami melaporkan skor akurasi lebih baik daripada sistem referensi dilatih dengan rata-rata 313 contoh paralel.', 'ko': '주제가 끊임없이 변화하는 업계에서 사용되는 기계번역(MT) 모델, 예를 들어 번역이나 뉴스 기관은 시간의 추이에 따라 성능을 유지하기 위해 새로운 데이터에 적응해야 한다.우리의 목표는 이전에 보이지 않았던 단어를 아주 적은 예에 따라 정확하게 번역하는 미리 훈련된 기계 번역 모델을 가르치는 것이다.우리는 (i) 인류가 제출한 번역에 나타난 새로운 어휘와 (ii)에 해당하는 평가 지표를 모의하여 우리의 방법을 비교할 수 있는 실험 장치를 제시했다.우리는 비슷한 상하문을 가진 신조어 훈련 예시를 만들기 위해 예훈련 언어 모델을 사용하는 데이터 강화 방법을 확장했다.우리는 서로 다른 마이크로스피커와 데이터 강화 방법을 비교하였으며, 1~5개 예시의 범위 내에서 조정하는 것이 가능하다는 것을 나타냈다.데이터 강화와 무작위로 선택한 트레이닝 문장을 결합하면 가장 높은 BLEU 점수와 정확성을 높일 수 있다.인상적인 것은 단지 1개에서 5개의 사례만 우리의 모델이 평균 313개의 평행 사례 훈련의 참고 시스템보다 더 정확한 점수를 보고했다는 것이다.', 'de': 'Modelle für maschinelle Übersetzung (MT) in Branchen mit sich ständig ändernden Themen, wie Übersetzungs- oder Nachrichtenagenturen, müssen sich an neue Daten anpassen, um ihre Leistung im Laufe der Zeit aufrechtzuerhalten. Unser Ziel ist es, einem vorgetrainierten MT-Modell beizubringen, um bisher unbekannte Wörter anhand von wenigen Beispielen präzise zu übersetzen. Wir schlagen (i) einen experimentellen Aufbau vor, der es uns ermöglicht, neuartige Vokabeln zu simulieren, die in von Menschen übermittelten Übersetzungen vorkommen, und (ii) entsprechende Evaluationsmetriken, um unsere Ansätze zu vergleichen. Wir erweitern einen Data Augmentation Ansatz mit einem vortrainierten Sprachmodell, um Trainingsbeispiele mit ähnlichen Kontexten für neuartige Wörter zu erstellen. Wir vergleichen verschiedene Fine-Tuning- und Data Augmentation Ansätze und zeigen, dass eine Anpassung im Maßstab von ein bis fünf Beispielen möglich ist. Die Kombination von Datenaufnahmen mit zufällig ausgewählten Trainingssätzen führt zu den höchsten BLEU-Werten und Genauigkeitsverbesserungen. Beeindruckend ist, dass unser Modell mit nur 1 bis 5 Beispielen bessere Genauigkeitswerte liefert als ein Referenzsystem, das mit durchschnittlich 313 parallelen Beispielen trainiert wurde.', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya mashine (MT) mifano inayotumiwa katika viwanda kwa kubadilisha mada kwa mara nyingi, kama vile tafsiri au mashirika ya habari, inahitaji kubadili taarifa mpya ili kuendelea utendaji wao kwa muda. Lengo letu ni kufundisha muundo wa MT wa zamani wa mafunzo ili kutafsiri maneno yasiyofahamika kwa sahihi, kwa kutumia mifano michache. Tupendekeza (mimi) seti ya majaribio inayoruhusu kutufananisha maneno ya kitabu yanayoonekana katika tafsiri zinazotumiwa na binadamu, na (i i) mitindo inayofanana na utafiti unaofanana kulinganisha mbinu zetu. Tunaendelea mbinu za kuongeza taarifa kwa kutumia mtindo wa lugha unaoendelea kutengeneza mifano ya mafunzo yenye michoro kama hayo kwa maneno ya kisasa. Tunawalinganisha mafanikio tofauti na kuongezeka kwa takwimu na kuonyesha kwamba kuboresha kwa kiwango cha mifano moja hadi mitano inawezekana. Kuunganisha taarifa kwa hukumu za mafunzo zilizochaguliwa kwa urahisi unapelekea vipimo vya juu vya BLEU na maendeleo ya sahihi. Inawezekana, kwa mfano 1 hadi 5 tu, mifano yetu inaripoti vipimo vizuri zaidi ya mfumo wa maoni uliojifundishwa kwa wastani 313 vilivyofanana.', 'fa': 'مدلهای ترجمه ماشینی (MT) که در صنعت\u200cها استفاده می\u200cشود با موضوع\u200cهای تغییر همیشه، مانند ترجمه\u200cها یا سازمان\u200cهای خبری، نیاز دارند که به داده\u200cهای جدید برای حفظ عملشان در طول زمان adapt کنند. هدف ما این است که یک مدل MT پیش آموزش داده شده را آموزش دهیم تا کلمات پیش از این غیب دقیق را ترجمه کند، بر اساس بسیار کم مثال. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم (i) یک تنظیم آزمایشی که به ما اجازه می\u200cدهد کلمات جدید را شبیه سازی کنیم که در ترجمه\u200cهای تسلیم شده\u200cی انسان ظاهر می\u200cشود، و (ii) متریک ارزیابی با ارزیابی برای مقایسه کردن دستورات ما. ما روش افزایش داده\u200cها را با استفاده از یک مدل زبان پیش\u200cفرض برای ایجاد مثالهای آموزش با موضوع مشابه برای کلمات روزنامه گسترش می\u200cدهیم. ما به طریق افزایش داده\u200cها و تنظیم\u200cکننده\u200cهای متفاوت و داده\u200cها مقایسه می\u200cکنیم و نشان می\u200cدهیم که تغییرات در مقایسه\u200cی یک تا پنج مثال ممکن است. تعداد افزایش داده\u200cها با جمله\u200cهای آموزشی تصادفی انتخاب شده به بالاترین امتیاز BLEU و بهترین دقیقیت\u200cها رهبری می\u200cکند. جالب است، با فقط ۱ تا ۵ مثال، مدل ما گزارش داده می\u200cشود که نقاط دقیق بهتر از یک سیستم مربوط آموزش شده با میانگین 313 مثال parallel.', 'tr': 'Makina terjime etmek (MT) nusgalary industrialda hemişe meýdançalar üýtgetmek bilen ullanylýar. Çeviri ýa-da täze maglumatlar üçin täze maglumatlara geçirmelidir. Biziň maksadymyz öň-bilinmiş MT nusgasyny öňünden görä görmän sözleri dogry terjime etmek üçin öwretmekdir. Biz (i) adam gönderilen terjimelerde ýazylan roman sözlerini çaklamak üçin bir deneysel setirme teklip edip, we (ii) golaýlarymyzy ýalyşyrmak üçin ylalaşýan çözümler metriklerini çaklaştyrýarys. Biz ýakyn sözler üçin örnekler bejermek üçin, ýakyn dil nusgasyny ulanarak maglumat täzeliklerini gollaşdyrýarys. Biz farklı şekilde düzeltmek we maglumaty beýleki örneklere karşılaştyrýarys we biriniň derejesinde beş örneklere uygulamanyň mümkinçiligini görkez. Maglumat täzeden saýlanan eğitim sözleri bilen birleşdirmek iň ýokary BLEU अंश we dogry düzeldilerine çevrilýär. Gynanç şekilde, diňe 1 we 5 mysal bilen modelimiz 313 parallel mysal bilen eğitilen referens sisteminden has dogry notlary gowy görkezýär.', 'am': 'የመኪን ትርጉም (MT) ሞዴላዎች (MT) በጉዳዮች ላይ በመዘወትር የሚለውጡ ጉዳዮች፣ እንደትርጉም ወይም ዜና አካባቢዎች፣ አዲስ ዳታዎችን በጊዜው ለማስቀመጥ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ የእኛ ስልጣን አስቀድሞ የተጠቃሚ MT ሞዴል ማስተምር ነው፡፡ (እኔ) የሰው ትርጉም በሚገኘው የረኀብ ቃላትን በመስመር እና (i i) ለመተካከል በሚያሳየው የድምፅ ጉዳይ ማሳየትን እናስፈቅዳለን፡፡ አካባቢ ቋንቋ ምሳሌ በመጠቀም የዳታ አካባቢ ሥርዓትን ለመፍጠር እናሳድጋለን፡፡ የተለየ ጥሩ እና የዳታ አካባቢ ቅድሚያ እና የአንዱን ወደ አምስት ምሳሌ ማሳሳየት እንዲቻል እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር በተጨማሪም፣ 1 ወደ 5 ምሳሌዎች ብቻ፣ ሞዴላዎቻችን በመካከለኛ 313 ተሳያፊ ምሳሌዎች ከተማሩት የሥርዓት ስርዓት ብጤቶች የሚሻል ትክክል ሆኗል፡፡', 'af': "Masjien vertaling (MT) modele gebruik word in industries met konstantelik verander onderwerpe, soos vertaling of nuusagencies, moet na nuwe data aanpas om hulle prestasie oor tyd te hou. Ons doel is om 'n pre- trained MT model te leer om voorheen ongesien woorde regverdig te vertaal, gebaseer op baie paar voorbeelde. Ons voorstel (i) â\x80\x99n eksperimentale opstelling wat ons toelaat om novele woordeboek te simuleer wat in menslike vertalings verskyn, en (ii) ooreenstemmende evalueringsmetries om ons toegang te vergelyk. Ons uitbrei 'n data augmentasie toegang deur 'n voorreen taal model te skep voorbeelde met gelyke konteks vir novele woorde. Ons vergelyk verskillende fine-tuning en data-augmentasie toekoms en wys dat aanpassing op die skaal van een tot vyf voorbeelde moontlik is. Kombineering van data vergroot met willekeurige gekose onderwerp setinge lei na die hoogste BLEU-punt en presies verbeteringe. Impressief, met slegs 1 tot 5 voorbeelde, ons model rapporteer beter presisiteitstelling as 'n verwysing stelsel opgelei met gemiddelde 313 parallele voorbeelde.", 'sq': 'Machine translation (MT) models used in industries with constantly changing topics, such as translation or news agencies, need to adapt to new data to maintain their performance over time.  Our aim is to teach a pre-trained MT model to translate previously unseen words accurately, based on very few examples.  Ne propozojmë (i) një konfigurim eksperimental që na lejon të simulojmë fjalorin e ri që shfaqet në përkthimet e paraqitura nga njerëzit dhe (ii) metrikat korrespondente të vlerësimit për të krahasuar qasjet tona. Ne zgjerojmë një qasje shtimi të të dhënave duke përdorur një model gjuhësh të paramësuar për të krijuar shembuj trajnimi me kontekste të ngjashme për fjalë të reja. Ne krahasojmë metodat e ndryshme të rregullimit dhe rritjes së të dhënave dhe tregojmë se adaptimi në shkallën e një deri në pesë shembujve është i mundur. Combining data augmentation with randomly selected training sentences leads to the highest BLEU score and accuracy improvements.  Në mënyrë mbresëlënëse, me vetëm 1 deri 5 shembuj, modeli ynë raporton rezultate më të mira saktësisë se një sistem referimi i stërvitur me mesatarisht 313 shembuj paralele.', 'hy': '談榨謩榨斩铡盏斋斩 诈铡謤眨沾铡斩沾铡斩 (MT) 沾崭栅榨宅斩榨謤炸, 崭謤崭斩謩 謪眨湛铡眨崭謤债站崭謧沾 榨斩 铡謤栅盏崭謧斩铡闸榨謤崭謧诈盏崭謧斩斩榨謤崭謧沾, 崭謤湛榨詹 沾辗湛铡蘸榨战 謨崭謨崭窄站崭謧沾 榨斩 诈榨沾铡斩榨謤, 斋斩展蘸斋战斋謩 榨斩 诈铡謤眨沾铡斩沾铡斩 寨铡沾 斩崭謤崭謧诈盏崭謧斩斩榨謤斋 眨崭謤债铡寨铡宅崭謧诈盏崭謧斩斩榨謤炸, 蘸榨湛謩 乍 瞻铡謤沾铡謤站榨斩 斩崭謤 湛站盏铡宅斩榨謤斋 瞻榨湛, 崭謤蘸榨战咋斋 蘸铡瞻蘸铡斩榨斩 斋謤榨斩 Our aim is to teach a pre-trained MT model to translate previously unseen words accurately, based on very few examples.  We propose (i) an experimental setup allowing us to simulate novel vocabulary appearing in human-submitted translations, and (ii) corresponding evaluation metrics to compare our approaches.  談榨斩謩 炸斩栅宅铡盏斩崭謧沾 榨斩謩 湛站盏铡宅斩榨謤斋 闸铡謤毡謤铡謥沾铡斩 沾崭湛榨謥崭謧沾炸, 謪眨湛铡眨崭謤债榨宅崭站 斩铡窄铡站铡謤摘站铡债 宅榨咋站斋 沾崭栅榨宅, 崭謤蘸榨战咋斋 战湛榨詹债榨斩謩 崭謧战崭謧謥沾铡斩 謪謤斋斩铡寨斩榨謤 斩崭謤 闸铡占榨謤斋 斩沾铡斩 寨崭斩湛榨謩战湛斩榨謤崭站: 談榨斩謩 瞻铡沾榨沾铡湛崭謧沾 榨斩謩 湛铡謤闸榨謤 闸铡謤毡謤铡謥沾铡斩 謬 湛站盏铡宅斩榨謤斋 铡粘斋 沾崭湛榨謥崭謧沾斩榨謤炸 謬 謥崭謧盏謥 榨斩謩 湛铡宅斋战, 崭謤 瞻铡謤沾铡謤榨謥沾铡斩 瞻斩铡謤铡站崭謤 乍 沾榨寨-瞻斋斩眨 謪謤斋斩铡寨斋 展铡謨斋 站謤铡: 諒站盏铡宅斩榨謤斋 铡粘斋 瞻铡沾铡栅謤崭謧沾炸 蘸铡湛铡瞻铡寨铡斩崭謤榨斩 炸斩湛謤站铡债 崭謧战崭謧沾斩铡战斋謤崭謧诈盏铡斩 斩铡窄铡栅铡战崭謧诈盏崭謧斩斩榨謤斋 瞻榨湛 瞻铡斩眨榨謥斩崭謧沾 乍 铡沾榨斩铡闸铡謤毡謤 眨斩铡瞻铡湛铡寨铡斩斋 謬 粘辗眨謤湛崭謧诈盏铡斩 闸铡謤榨宅铡站沾铡斩: 諃榨湛铡謩謤謩斋謤斩 铡盏斩 乍, 崭謤 沾斋铡盏斩 1-5 謪謤斋斩铡寨崭站 沾榨謤 沾崭栅榨宅炸 謥崭謧盏謥 乍 湛铡宅斋战 铡站榨宅斋 粘辗眨謤斋湛 眨斩铡瞻铡湛铡寨铡斩斩榨謤, 謩铡斩 瞻铡沾榨沾铡湛铡寨铡斩 瞻铡沾铡寨铡謤眨炸, 崭謤炸 战崭站崭謤榨謥謤榨宅 乍 沾斋栈斋斩 313 咋崭謧眨铡瞻榨占 謪謤斋斩铡寨崭站:', 'az': 'Tərcümə və xəbər aģentūrları kimi, yeni məlumatlara uyğunlaşdırmaq üçün yeni məlumatlara uyğunlaşmalıdır. Bizim amacımız, əvvəlcə görmədikləri sözləri doğru çevirib, çox az nümunələrə dayanan MT modelini öyrətməkdir. Biz (i) təcrübə qurğunu təbliğ edirik ki, insanların təslim edilmiş tərcümlərdə gələn yeni sözləri simülə etsək və ( ii) tərəflərimizi salmaq üçün müqayisədə olan təcrübə metrikləri. Biz yeni sözlər üçün bənzər məsələlər olan təhsil məsələləri yaratmaq üçün əvvəlki dil modeli vasitəsilə məlumatları artırmaq tərzini genişləyirik. Biz müxtəlif təmizləmə və məlumat yükselmə yaxınlıqlarını salıyırıq və bir ilə beş nümunə mümkün olduğunu göstəririk. Ən yüksək BLEU nöqtəsinə və doğruluqlarına yol göstərir. Sadece 1-5 misallar ilə modellərimizin doğruluğu göstərilməsi üçün ortalama 313 paralel misallarda təhsil edilmiş referans sistemindən daha yaxşıdır.', 'cs': 'Modely strojového překladu (MT) používané v průmyslových odvětvích s neustále se měnícími tématy, jako jsou překladatelské nebo zpravodajské agentury, se musí přizpůsobit novým datům, aby se udržely svůj výkon v průběhu času. Naším cílem je naučit předškolený MT model překládat dříve neviděná slova přesně na základě velmi málo příkladů. Navrhujeme (i) experimentální nastavení, které nám umožňuje simulovat novou slovní zásobu objevující se v lidských překladech a (ii) odpovídající hodnotící metriky pro porovnání našich přístupů. Rozšiřujeme přístup rozšíření dat pomocí předem trénovaného jazykového modelu k vytvoření příkladů tréninku s podobným kontextem pro nová slova. Porovnáváme různé přístupy jemného ladění a rozšíření dat a ukazujeme, že adaptace v měřítku jednoho až pěti příkladů je možná. Kombinace rozšíření dat s náhodně vybranými tréninkovými větami vede k nejvyššímu skóre BLEU a zlepšení přesnosti. Působivé je, že s pouze 1 až pěti příklady, náš model vykazuje lepší skóre přesnosti než referenční systém trénovaný na průměrných paralelních příkladech 313.', 'bn': 'মেশিন অনুবাদ (এমটি) মডেল, যেমন অনুবাদ অথবা সংবাদ সংস্থাগুলোর মতো ক্রমাগত পরিবর্তনের বিষয়গুলোতে ব্যবহার করা হয়, তাদের অনুবাদ বা সময়ের পরিবর্তন আমাদের উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে পূর্ববর্তী অদৃশ্য শব্দের সঠিকভাবে অনুবাদ করার জন্য এমটি মডেল শিক্ষা দেওয়া যায়, যা কয়েকটি  আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি (আমি) একটি পরীক্ষামূলক সেটিং যাতে আমাদের মানুষের প্রাপ্ত অনুবাদে উপস্থিত শব্দভাণ্ডারের সিমালেট করা যায় এবং (ই) আমাদের উপায়ের আমরা একটি ভাষার মডেল ব্যবহার করে তথ্য যোগাযোগের ক্ষেত্রে প্রশিক্ষণের উদাহরণ সৃষ্টি করতে পারি বর্তমান শব্দের জন্য। আমরা ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন সংস্কার এবং তথ্য বাড়ানোর কাছে তুলনা করি এবং দেখাচ্ছি  Combining data augmentation with randomly selected training sentences leads to the highest BLEU score and accuracy improvements.  মাত্র ১ থেকে ৫ উদাহরণের মাধ্যমে আমাদের মডেলের সংবাদ প্রদান করা হয়েছে যেখানে গড়ে ৩১৩ টি প্যারালেল উদাহরণের মধ্যে প্রশিক', 'bs': 'Modeli automatskog prevoda (MT) koji se koriste u industriji sa stalno mijenjajućim temama, poput prevoda ili novinskih agencija, moraju se prilagoditi novim podacima kako bi održali svoj izvod tijekom vremena. Naš cilj je naučiti predobučeni MT model da prevodi prethodno nevidjene riječi tačno, na temelju vrlo malo primjera. Predlažemo i) eksperimentalnu ustanovu koja nam omogućava da simuliramo nov rečnik koji se pojavljuje u ljudskim prevodima, i ii) odgovarajuće mjere procjene da usporedimo naše pristupe. Povećavamo pristup povećanjem podataka koristeći pretrenirani jezički model kako bi stvorili primjere obuke sa sličnim kontekstima za nove riječi. Uspoređujemo različite pristupe dobrovoljstva i povećanja podataka i pokazujemo da je moguće adaptacija na skali jedne do pet primjera. Kombinacija povećanja podataka sa nasumično izabranim kaznama za obuku vodi do najvišeg rezultata BLEU-a i poboljšanja preciznosti. Impresivno, sa samo 1 do 5 primjera, naši modeli izvještavaju bolje tačnosti nego referentni sistem obučen prosječnim 313 paralelnih primjera.', 'ca': "Els models de traducció màquina (MT) utilitzats en indústries amb temes constantment canviants, com la traducció o les agències de notícies, han d'adaptar-se a les noves dades per mantenir el seu rendiment al llarg del temps. El nostre objectiu és ensenyar a un model MT pré-entrenat a traduir paraules anteriorment invisibles amb precisió, basats en molts pocs exemples. Proposem (i) una configuració experimental que ens permet simular un vocabulari nou que apareix en traduccions submetides per a l'home, i (ii) les mètriques d'evaluació correspondents per comparar els nostres enfocaments. Estendem un enfocament d'augmentació de dades fent servir un model de llenguatge preconformat per crear exemples d'entrenament amb contextos similars per paraules noves. Comparem diferents enfocaments d'ajustament i augment de dades i demostram que l'adaptació a escala d'un a cinc exemples és possible. Combinar l'augment de dades amb frases d'entrenament seleccionats aleatòriament porta a la puntuació BLEU més alta i a millores de precisió. Impresionantment, amb només 1 a 5 exemples, el nostre model relata millors puntuacions de precisió que un sistema de referència entrenat amb una mitjana de 313 exemples parallels.", 'fi': 'Konekäännösmallien (MT) malleja, joita käytetään teollisuudenaloilla, joilla on jatkuvasti muuttuvia aiheita, kuten käännös- tai uutistoimistoissa, on mukautettava uuteen dataan säilyttääkseen suorituskykynsä ajan mittaan. Tavoitteenamme on opettaa ennalta koulutettu MT-malli kääntämään aiemmin näkemättömiä sanoja tarkasti, hyvin harvojen esimerkkien pohjalta. Ehdotamme (i) kokeellista kokoonpanoa, jonka avulla voimme simuloida ihmisen lähettämässä käännöksessä esiintyvää uutta sanastoa, ja (ii) vastaavia arviointimittareita lähestymistapojemme vertailuun. Laajennamme datan lisäämiseen perustuvaa lähestymistapaa käyttäen esikoulutettua kielimallia luodaksemme koulutusesimerkkejä samanlaisista konteksteista uusille sanoille. Vertailemme erilaisia hienosäätö- ja datan lisäämismenetelmiä ja osoitamme, että sopeutuminen yhdestä viiteen esimerkkiin on mahdollista. Datan lisäämisen yhdistäminen satunnaisesti valittuihin harjoituslauseisiin johtaa korkeimpiin BLEU-pisteisiin ja tarkkuuden parantamiseen. Vaikuttavaa on, että mallimme tuottaa vain 1–5 esimerkkiä paremman tarkkuuden kuin vertailujärjestelmä, joka on koulutettu keskimäärin 313 rinnakkaisella esimerkillä.', 'et': 'Masintõlke mudelid, mida kasutatakse pidevalt muutuvate teemadega tööstusharudes, nagu tõlke- või uudisteagentuurid, peavad kohanema uute andmetega, et säilitada oma jõudlus aja jooksul. Meie eesmärk on õpetada eelnevalt koolitatud MT mudelit tõlkima varem nähtamatuid sõnu täpselt, põhinedes väga vähestel näidetel. Pakume välja (i) eksperimentaalse seadistuse, mis võimaldab meil simuleerida uudset sõnavara, mis ilmub inimese esitatud tõlketes, ja (ii) vastavad hindamismeetodid meie lähenemisviiside võrdlemiseks. Laiendame andmete suurendamise lähenemisviisi, kasutades eeltreenitud keelemudelit, et luua sarnaste kontekstidega koolitusnäiteid uudsete sõnade jaoks. Võrdleme erinevaid peenhäälestus- ja andmete suurendamise lähenemisviise ning näitame, et kohanemine ühe kuni viie näite skaalal on võimalik. Andmete suurendamise kombineerimine juhuslikult valitud treeninglausetega toob kaasa kõrgeima BLEU skoori ja täpsuse paranemise. Muljetavaldavalt annab meie mudel ainult 1 kuni 5 näite puhul paremad täpsuskoorid kui võrdlussüsteem, mis on koolitatud keskmiselt 313 paralleelse näitega.', 'jv': 'Maskin translation (MT) model sing dikoleh nèng manungsa ingkang dianggap banter temu, kaya penterjamahan karo perintah sing gawe informasi, kudu sampek kanggo data sing gawe ngubah dhéwé kanggo nggawe akeh operasi sistem. Punika awak dhéwé iku, sistem MT sing sampeyan luwih dumaten kanggo terjamah pawaran sing dadi apik, basa ning susahe kapan sithik. Awak dhéwé gunakake (i) nggawe aturan pilihan sing nyengké nggawe sistem Anyar Manual sing nyengkuyung tarjamahan karo pawaran-nyengkuyung, lan (i i) cara-nyengkuyung dolanan meta-nyengkuyung kanggo nyengkuyung nggawe gerarané awak dhéwé. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem data ogwektu nggawe sistem kuwi nggawe perusahaan anyar tentang kanggo nggawe ulih modèl kuwi nggawe kudu nggawe Perintah sing koyok tarjamahan kanggo kelas kuwi bagian. Awak dhéwé ngerasakno sistem sing dibutungan sampeyan karo perusahaan anyar tentang karo perusahaan langgar sampeyan sampeyan sampeyan siji-sampeyan sing bisa dianggap. Jejaring dong-jejaring Sugeng-perusahaan lang sampeyan 1 sampeyan 5 saiki, akeh model kuwi alam sing paling kelas antara karo sistem sing dadi sing nyimpen karo hal-alam telat, nyong alam', 'ha': "Machine translation (MT) models used in industries with constantly changing topics, such as translation or news agencies, need to adapt to new data to maintain their performance over time.  Gana kanmu ne ya sanar da wani misali na MT ya yi zaman da aka sanar da shi tabbatacce, a kan bincike da misãlai kaɗan. Tuna goyya da tsari mai jarrabo ko da za'a sami misalin maganar nohanna wanda ke cikin fassarar da aka bãyar da cikin mutum da kuma (i i) metric masu daidai da idan ya sami hanyoyinmu. Mu ƙara wata hanyor ƙaramako da data da za'a yi amfani da wani misali da aka ƙayyade harshen wa'ura dõmin ya ƙiƙiri misãlai da misãlai masu daidaita wa maganar nowaya. Tuna samfani masu amfani da kuma ƙari da data na sami-daidai, kuma tuna nuna cewa adadi wa misali guda zuwa shan, za'a iya amfani. Combining addition data to randal selected language Ina amfani, da misãlai 1 zuwa 5 kawai, misãlai kanmu yana bãyar da lãbãri masu shirya matsayin tsari mafi kyãwo daga system na Reference wanda aka sanar da shi a tsakanin misãlai masu daidaita 31 3.", 'he': 'Machine translation (MT) models used in industries with constantly changing topics, such as translation or news agencies, need to adapt to new data to maintain their performance over time.  המטרה שלנו היא ללמד מודל MT מאומן מראש לתרגם מילים בלתי נראות קודם בדיוק, בהתבסס על כמה דוגמאות. אנו מציעים (i) ערכת ניסויים מאפשרת לנו להדמיין מילים חדשים שמופיעים בתרגשות שנשלחו ע"י בני אדם, ו (ii) מטריות הערכה מתאימות להשוות את גישותינו. אנו ממשיכים גישה מגדלת נתונים באמצעות דוגמא שפה מאומנת מראש כדי ליצור דוגמאות אימונים עם קשרים דומים למילים חדשות. אנחנו משוותים גישות מתאימות ומעלות נתונים שונות ומראים שההתאמה בסולם של אחת עד חמש דוגמאות אפשרית. שילוב גידול נתונים עם משפטי אימון שנבחרו באופן אקראי מוביל לתוצאה BLEU הגבוהה ביותר ושיפורים מדויקים. באופן מרשים, עם רק דוגמאות 1-5, הדוגמא שלנו דווחת על נקודות מדוייקות טובות יותר מאשר מערכת התייחסות מאומנת עם בממוצע 313 דוגמאות מקבילות.', 'sk': 'Modeli strojnega prevajanja (MT), ki se uporabljajo v panogah s stalno spreminjajočimi se temami, kot so prevajalske agencije ali novinarske agencije, se morajo prilagoditi novim podatkom, da bi sčasoma ohranili svojo uspešnost. Naš cilj je poučiti vnaprej usposobljeni model MT za natančno prevajanje prej nevidnih besed, ki temelji na zelo malo primerov. Predlagamo (i) eksperimentalno nastavitev, ki nam omogoča simuliranje novega besedišča, ki se pojavlja v človeških prevodih, in (ii) ustrezne meritve vrednotenja za primerjavo naših pristopov. Razširimo pristop povečanja podatkov z uporabo predtreniranega jezikovnega modela za ustvarjanje primerov usposabljanja s podobnimi konteksti za nove besede. Primerjamo različne pristope finega uravnavanja in povečanja podatkov ter pokažemo, da je možna prilagoditev na lestvici enega do petih primerov. Združevanje povečanja podatkov z naključno izbranimi vadbenimi stavki vodi do najvišje rezultate BLEU in izboljšanja natančnosti. Naš model s samo 1 do 5 primeri poroča boljše ocene natančnosti kot referenčni sistem, usposobljen s povprečno 313 vzporednimi primeri.', 'bo': 'Machine translation (MT) models used in industries with constantly changing topics, such as translation or news agencies, need to adapt to new data to maintain their performance over time. ང་ཚོའི་དམིགས We propose (i) an experimental setup allowing us to simulate novel vocabulary appearing in human-submitted translations, and (ii) corresponding evaluation metrics to compare our approaches. ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལྡན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་མ་དཔེ་བས། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་མི་འདྲ་བ་དང་ཞིབ་བཤེར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་མི་འདྲ་བ་དང་བསྡུར་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་གྱིས།དཔེར་ན། Combining data augmentation with randomly selected training sentences leads to the highest BLEU score and accuracy improvements. ལས་འཕགས་པ་ཡིན་ན། དཔེར་ན། མ་དབྱིབས་དཔེ་གཞུང་གིས་བདེ་འཇགས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ལྟར་མང་ཙམ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Zero-shot Generalization in Dialog State Tracking through Generative Question Answering', 'ar': 'التعميم بدون طلقة في تتبع حالة الحوار من خلال الإجابة التوليدية على الأسئلة', 'pt': 'Generalização Zero-shot no Rastreamento de Estado de Diálogo por meio de Resposta Gerativa de Perguntas', 'fr': "Généralisation à zéro dans le suivi de l'état des boîtes de dialogue par réponse générative aux questions", 'es': 'Generalización cero en el seguimiento del estado de diálogo a través de respuestas generativas a preguntas', 'ja': 'ダイアログ状態でのゼロショットの一般化、生成的な質問の回答によるトラッキング', 'zh': '因生成式问对以零次泛化', 'hi': 'जननात्मक प्रश्न उत्तर के माध्यम से संवाद राज्य ट्रैकिंग में शून्य-शॉट सामान्यीकरण', 'ru': 'Обобщение с нулевым выстрелом при отслеживании состояния диалога посредством ответа на генеративный вопрос', 'ga': 'Ginearálú Zero-shot i Rianú Stáit Dialóige trí Fhreagrú Ceist Ghinideach', 'el': 'Γενικοποίηση μηδενικού πυροβολισμού στην παρακολούθηση κατάστασης διαλόγου μέσω της γενικής απάντησης ερωτήσεων', 'hu': 'Zero-shot általánosítás a párbeszédállapot nyomon követésében generált kérdések megválaszolásán keresztül', 'ka': 'დიალოგის სტატუსის განმავლობაში ნულ სტატუსის გენერალაცია', 'it': 'Generalizzazione a scatto zero nel monitoraggio dello stato di dialogo attraverso la risposta alle domande generative', 'kk': 'Диалог күйін қадағалау үшін нөл- сұрақ жауап беру', 'mk': 'Генерализација со нула снимка во состојбата на дијалогот следи преку генеративен одговор на прашања', 'lt': 'Zero-shot generalizacija dialogo būsenoje sekant per generuotą atsakymą į klausimus', 'mt': 'Zero-shot Generalization in Dialog State Tracking through Generative Question Answering', 'ms': 'Jeneralisasi 0-shot dalam keadaan Dialog Menjejak melalui Jawapan soalan Generasi', 'ml': 'ഡയലോഗ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ട്രാക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നതില്\u200d പൂജ്യത്തിലെ സാധാരണ ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിലൂടെ', 'no': 'Generalisering av null- bilete i dialogtilstand- sporing gjennom generert spørsmål- svar', 'pl': 'Zero-shot Generalizacja w śledzeniu stanu dialogu poprzez generatywne odpowiedzi na pytania', 'ro': 'Generalizarea zero-shot în urmărirea stării dialogului prin răspunsul la întrebări generate', 'mn': 'Диалог улс орнуудын дагууллагаар Zero-shot жагсаалт', 'so': 'Zero-shot Generalization in Dialog State Tracking through Generative Question Answering', 'sv': 'Generalisering med nollskott i spårning av dialogtillstånd genom genererande frågesvar', 'si': 'සුන්නරුප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාර ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයෙන් සංවාද ස්ථානයේ සංවාද ස්ථා', 'ta': 'பொதுவான கேள்வி பதில்', 'sr': 'Generalizacija nula pogodaka u državnom praćenju dijaloga kroz odgovor na generativno pitanje', 'ur': 'جرائل سؤال جواب دینے کے ذریعے صفر-شٹ جرائنالیزی ڈیلوگ سٹیٹ ٹراکینگ میں', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chế độ phun đại từ trường quay qua câu hỏi kiểu Thế hệ', 'nl': 'Zero-shot generalisatie bij het bijhouden van dialoogstatus via Generatieve vragenbeantwoording', 'da': 'Generalisering af nulskud i sporing af dialogtilstand gennem genereret spørgsmål besvarelse', 'hr': 'Generalizacija nula pogodaka u državnom praćenju dijaloga kroz odgovor na generativno pitanje', 'bg': 'Генерализация с нулев изстрел в проследяване на състоянието на диалога чрез генеративно отговаряне на въпроси', 'id': 'Generalisasi Zero-shot dalam keadaan dialog melacak melalui Jawaban Pertanyaan Generatif', 'de': 'Zero-Shot-Generalisierung bei der Verfolgung des Dialogzustandes durch generative Fragebeantwortung', 'ko': '생성성 퀴즈 대화 상태 추적 중의 제로 렌즈 범위화', 'fa': 'توسط پاسخ سؤال نسل\u200cآفرینی صفر فشار در ردیابی ایالت دیalog', 'af': 'Nuwe- skoot Generalisasie in Dialoog Staat Volg deur Genereerde Fraag Antwoord', 'am': 'ቦታ፦', 'sw': 'Umoja wa risasi zisizo na risasi katika Taifa la Dialog kufuatilia kupitia swali la Kizalendo', 'hy': 'Զերոնկարների գեներալիզացիա դասախոսության վիճակում, որոնք հետևում են գեներատիվ հարցերի պատասխանների միջոցով', 'az': 'D톛nizli sual cavab vasit톛sil톛 Dialog Eyaleti 캻zl톛m톛sind톛 S캼f캼r-shot Generalizasyonu', 'bn': 'জেনারেটিভ প্রশ্নের উত্তরের মাধ্যমে ডায়ালগ স্টেট ট্র্যাকিং এর জেনারেলিজেশন', 'bs': 'Generalizacija nula pogodaka u državnom praćenju dijaloga kroz odgovor na generativno pitanje', 'tr': 'Dialog durumynda janlaşdyrma', 'ca': "Generalització de zero en el diàleg de seguiment de l'estat a través de la resposta generativa a preguntes", 'sq': 'Gjeneralizimi zero-shot në gjendjen e dialogut duke ndjekur nëpërmjet përgjigjeve gjenerative të pyetjeve', 'et': 'Nullshot generaliseerimine dialoogi oleku jälgimises generatiivse küsimustele vastamise kaudu', 'cs': 'Zero-shot generalizace ve sledování stavu dialogu prostřednictvím generativního zodpovězení otázek', 'fi': 'Nollashotin yleistäminen dialogin tilan seurannassa generatiivisen kysymysvastauksen avulla', 'jv': 'query-criteria', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Ničelna generalizacija v sledenju stanju pogovornega okna prek generativnega odgovarjanja na vprašanja', 'bo': 'ཌའི་ལོག་གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་རྗེས་ལྟ་ཀློག་སྟངས་མིན་པ་ལས་བཟོ་བར་གནས་ཚུལ་ཁ་སྐོང་བརྗོད་མ།', 'he': 'הגנרליזציה אפס במצב הדיולוגים מעקב דרך תשובות לשאלות גנרטיביות'}
{'en': 'Dialog State Tracking (DST), an integral part of modern dialog systems, aims to track user preferences and constraints (slots) in task-oriented dialogs. In real-world settings with constantly changing services, DST systems must generalize to new domains and unseen slot types. Existing methods for DST do not generalize well to new slot names and many require known ontologies of slot types and values for inference. We introduce a novel ontology-free framework that supports natural language queries for unseen constraints and slots in multi-domain task-oriented dialogs. Our approach is based on generative question-answering using a conditional language model pre-trained on substantive English sentences. Our model improves joint goal accuracy in zero-shot domain adaptation settings by up to 9 % (absolute) over the previous state-of-the-art on the MultiWOZ 2.1 dataset.', 'pt': 'O Dialog State Tracking (DST), parte integrante dos sistemas de diálogo modernos, visa rastrear as preferências e restrições do usuário (slots) em diálogos orientados a tarefas. Em configurações do mundo real com serviços em constante mudança, os sistemas DST devem generalizar para novos domínios e tipos de slots não vistos. Os métodos existentes para DST não generalizam bem para novos nomes de slots e muitos requerem ontologias conhecidas de tipos de slots e valores para inferência. Apresentamos uma nova estrutura livre de ontologias que suporta consultas de linguagem natural para restrições e slots invisíveis em diálogos orientados a tarefas de vários domínios. Nossa abordagem é baseada em respostas generativas de perguntas usando um modelo de linguagem condicional pré-treinado em frases substantivas em inglês. Nosso modelo melhora a precisão do objetivo conjunto em configurações de adaptação de domínio de tiro zero em até 9% (absoluto) em relação ao estado da arte anterior no conjunto de dados MultiWOZ 2.1.', 'ar': 'يهدف تتبع حالة الحوار (DST) ، وهو جزء لا يتجزأ من أنظمة الحوار الحديثة ، إلى تتبع تفضيلات المستخدم والقيود (الفتحات) في الحوارات الموجهة نحو المهام. في إعدادات العالم الحقيقي ذات الخدمات المتغيرة باستمرار ، يجب أن تعمم أنظمة التوقيت الصيفي على المجالات الجديدة وأنواع الفتحات غير المرئية. لا تُعمم الأساليب الحالية الخاصة بالتوقيت الصيفي جيدًا على أسماء الفواصل الزمنية الجديدة ويتطلب الكثير منها أنطولوجيات معروفة لأنواع الفواصل الزمنية وقيم الاستدلال. نقدم إطارًا جديدًا خالٍ من الأنطولوجيا يدعم استعلامات اللغة الطبيعية للقيود والفتحات غير المرئية في الحوارات متعددة المجالات الموجهة للمهام. يعتمد نهجنا على الإجابة التوليدية للأسئلة باستخدام نموذج اللغة الشرطية الذي تم تدريبه مسبقًا على الجمل الإنجليزية الموضوعية. يعمل نموذجنا على تحسين دقة الهدف المشترك في إعدادات تكيف مجال اللقطة الصفرية بنسبة تصل إلى 9٪ (مطلق) مقارنة بأحدث التقنيات السابقة في مجموعة بيانات MultiWOZ 2.1.', 'es': 'El seguimiento de estado de diálogo (DST), una parte integral de los sistemas de diálogo modernos, tiene como objetivo realizar un seguimiento de las preferencias y restricciones del usuario (espacios) en los diálogos orientados a tareas. En entornos reales con servicios en constante cambio, los sistemas DST deben generalizarse a nuevos dominios y tipos de ranuras invisibles. Los métodos existentes para DST no se generalizan bien a los nuevos nombres de ranuras y muchos requieren ontologías conocidas de tipos y valores de ranuras para la inferencia. Presentamos un marco novedoso sin ontología que admite consultas en lenguaje natural para restricciones y espacios invisibles en diálogos orientados a tareas multidominio. Nuestro enfoque se basa en la respuesta generativa de preguntas utilizando un modelo de lenguaje condicional previamente entrenado en oraciones sustantivas en inglés. Nuestro modelo mejora la precisión de los objetivos conjuntos en configuraciones de adaptación de dominio de tiro cero hasta en un 9% (absoluto) con respecto al estado de la técnica anterior en el conjunto de datos MultiWoz 2.1.', 'fr': "Le suivi de l'état des dialogues (DST), partie intégrante des systèmes de dialogue modernes, vise à suivre les préférences et les contraintes des utilisateurs (créneaux) dans les boîtes de dialogue orientées tâches. Dans des environnements réels où les services changent constamment, les systèmes d'heure d'été doivent généraliser aux nouveaux domaines et aux types d'emplacements invisibles. Les méthodes existantes pour l'heure d'été ne se généralisent pas bien aux nouveaux noms d'emplacements et nombre d'entre elles nécessitent des ontologies connues de types et de valeurs d'emplacement pour l'inférence. Nous introduisons un nouveau framework sans ontologie qui prend en charge les requêtes en langage naturel pour les contraintes et les créneaux invisibles dans les boîtes de dialogue orientées tâches multidomaines. Notre approche est basée sur des réponses génératives à des questions utilisant un modèle de langage conditionnel pré-entraîné sur des phrases anglaises substantielles. Notre modèle améliore la précision des objectifs communs dans les paramètres d'adaptation du domaine de tir zéro jusqu'à 9\xa0% (absolu) par rapport à l'état de pointe précédent sur le jeu de données MultiWOZ 2.1.", 'ja': 'ダイアログステートトラッキング（ DST ）は、最新のダイアログシステムの不可欠な部分であり、タスク指向ダイアログのユーザーの好みと制約（スロット）をトラッキングすることを目的としています。常に変化するサービスを持つ現実世界の設定では、DSTシステムは新しいドメインと見えないスロットタイプに一般化する必要があります。DSTのための既存の方法は、新しいスロット名にうまく一般化されず、多くは、推論のためのスロットタイプと値の既知のオントロジーを必要とする。私たちは、マルチドメインのタスク指向のダイアログで、見えない制約とスロットのための自然言語クエリをサポートする、新しいオントロジーフリーフレームワークを導入します。私たちのアプローチは、実質的な英語の文章について事前にトレーニングされた条件付き言語モデルを使用して、生成的な質問に答えることに基づいています。当社のモデルは、MultiWOZ 2.1データセットの以前の最先端のものよりも、ゼロショットドメイン適応設定の共同目標精度を最大9%（絶対）向上させます。', 'zh': '对话框状踪迹 (DST) 乃今代对话框统之一组成部分,指随事对话框之用户首选项约(槽)。 变化之实,DST 统必及新域,与不见之插槽。 DST 今法不可善推新槽名,多方须已知槽形与本体推理。 引入一新无本体框架,当框架扶自然语言询访,以决多域事,导以约束插槽。 吾道盖生式问答,豫练实质性英语句语模样。 吾法将零射域应设中之合准确率以崇9%(绝对值),先MultiWOZ 2.1集上之最新术也。', 'ru': 'Dialog State Tracking (DST), неотъемлемая часть современных диалоговых систем, предназначена для отслеживания пользовательских предпочтений и ограничений (слотов) в ориентированных на задачи диалоговых окнах. В реальных условиях с постоянно меняющимися сервисами DST-системы должны обобщать новые домены и невидимые типы слотов. Существующие методы для DST не очень хорошо обобщают новые имена слотов, и многие из них требуют известных онтологий типов слотов и значений для вывода. Мы представляем новый фреймворк без онтологии, который поддерживает запросы на естественном языке для невидимых ограничений и слотов в многодоменных диалогах, ориентированных на задачи. Наш подход основан на генеративном ответе на вопросы с использованием условной языковой модели, предварительно обученной основным английским предложениям. Наша модель повышает точность совместной цели в настройках адаптации домена с нулевым выстрелом до 9% (абсолютное значение) по сравнению с предыдущим современным набором данных MultiWOZ 2.1.', 'hi': 'संवाद स्थिति ट्रैकिंग (DST), आधुनिक संवाद प्रणालियों का एक अभिन्न अंग, कार्य-उन्मुख संवादों में उपयोगकर्ता प्राथमिकताओं और बाधाओं (स्लॉट) को ट्रैक करना है। लगातार बदलती सेवाओं के साथ वास्तविक दुनिया सेटिंग्स में, डीएसटी सिस्टम को नए डोमेन और अनदेखी स्लॉट प्रकारों के लिए सामान्यीकृत करना चाहिए। डीएसटी के लिए मौजूदा तरीके नए स्लॉट नामों के लिए अच्छी तरह से सामान्यीकृत नहीं करते हैं और कई को अनुमान के लिए स्लॉट प्रकार और मूल्यों के ज्ञात ontologies की आवश्यकता होती है। हम एक उपन्यास आंटोलॉजी-मुक्त रूपरेखा पेश करते हैं जो बहु-डोमेन कार्य-उन्मुख संवादों में अनदेखी बाधाओं और स्लॉट के लिए प्राकृतिक भाषा क्वेरी का समर्थन करता है। हमारा दृष्टिकोण एक सशर्त भाषा मॉडल का उपयोग करके मूल अंग्रेजी वाक्यों पर पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित उत्पादक प्रश्न-उत्तर पर आधारित है। हमारा मॉडल MultiWOZ 2.1 डेटासेट पर पिछले राज्य-कला की तुलना में 9% (निरपेक्ष) तक शून्य-शॉट डोमेन अनुकूलन सेटिंग्स में संयुक्त लक्ष्य सटीकता में सुधार करता है।', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag Dialog State Tracking (DST), mar chuid lárnach de chórais dialóige nua-aimseartha, roghanna agus srianta úsáideoirí (sliotáin) a rianú i ndialóga tasc-dhírithe. I suíomhanna sa saol fíor ina bhfuil seirbhísí ag athrú de shíor, ní mór do chórais DST ginearálú chuig fearann nua agus cineálacha sliotán nach bhfeictear. Ní ghineann na modhanna atá ann faoi láthair le haghaidh DST go maith le hainmneacha sliotán nua agus teastaíonn ontologies aitheanta de chineálacha sliotán agus luachanna le haghaidh tátail go leor. Tugaimid creat nua saor ó onteolaíocht isteach a thacaíonn le fiosrúcháin teanga nádúrtha maidir le srianta nach bhfacthas riamh cheana agus sliotáin i ndialóga ilfhearainn atá dírithe ar thascanna. Tá ár gcur chuige bunaithe ar fhreagra ginideach ag baint úsáide as múnla coinníollach teanga atá réamh-oilte ar abairtí substainteacha Béarla. Feabhsaíonn ár múnla cruinneas comhspriocanna i suíomhanna oiriúnaithe fearainn náid-shot suas le 9% (iomlán) thar an stát-de-aimseartha roimhe seo ar an tacar sonraí MultiWOZ 2.1.', 'el': 'Η παρακολούθηση κατάστασης διαλόγου, αναπόσπαστο μέρος των σύγχρονων συστημάτων διαλόγου, στοχεύει στην παρακολούθηση των προτιμήσεων και των περιορισμών των χρηστών (υποδοχές) σε διαλόγους προσανατολισμένους σε εργασίες. Σε πραγματικές ρυθμίσεις με συνεχώς μεταβαλλόμενες υπηρεσίες, τα συστήματα πρέπει να γενικεύονται σε νέους τομείς και αθέατους τύπους κουλοχέρηδων. Οι υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι δεν γενικεύονται καλά σε νέα ονόματα κουλοχέρηδων και πολλές απαιτούν γνωστές οντολογίες τύπων κουλοχέρηδων και τιμών για συμπέρασμα. Εισάγουμε ένα νέο πλαίσιο χωρίς οντολογία που υποστηρίζει ερωτήματα φυσικής γλώσσας για αόρατους περιορισμούς και υποδοχές σε διαλόγους με στόχο την εργασία πολλών τομέων. Η προσέγγισή μας βασίζεται στην αναπαραγωγική απάντηση ερωτήσεων χρησιμοποιώντας ένα υπό όρους γλωσσικό μοντέλο προεκπαίδευσης σε ουσιαστικές αγγλικές προτάσεις. Το μοντέλο μας βελτιώνει την ακρίβεια κοινών στόχων σε ρυθμίσεις προσαρμογής πεδίου μηδενικής βολής μέχρι 9% (απόλυτο) σε σχέση με την προηγούμενη κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας στο σύνολο δεδομένων 2.1.', 'ka': 'დიალოგის სტატის შენახვა (DST), მოდიალოგიური დიალოგის სისტემების ინტეგრალური ნაწილი, მიზეზიან მომხმარებელი პარამეტრები და ზომილებები (სისტემები) დავანახვა მომხ რეალური მსოფლიოს პარამეტრებში, სერვისების შეცვლაში, DST სისტემები უნდა განსაზღვრულება ახალი დიომენში და არაჩვენებული სისტემის ტიპებში. DST- ის მიმდინარე პროცემები ახალი სლოტის სახელებისთვის არ უნდა წარმოადგენა და ბევრი უნდა ინფრენციისთვის ცნობილი სლოტის ტიპების და მნიშვნელობების ანტოლოგიების ჩვენ მოვიყენებთ პრომენტი ანტოლოგიის ბირადი ფრამეტრი, რომელიც მოხმარებს ნორმალური ენის კითხვების შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც მრავალური დემომინის მომხმარებული დავალების დიალო ჩვენი პროგრამა დაბაზიან წარმოადგენელი კითხვების გასაღებისთვის, რომელიც სწორედ ენის მოდელის გამოყენებაში, რომელიც წარმოადგენა საკუთარი ანგლისური წარ ჩვენი მოდელი უფრო მეტადებს ერთადერთი მიზეზი წარმოდგენება ნულ-სტარტის დიომენის აეპტიფიკაციის შესახებ 9% (აბსოლუტური) წინაღალდეგის წინაღალდეგის წარმოდგენება MultiWOZ', 'kk': 'Диалогтың күйін қадағалау (DST), кәзіргі диалог жүйелерінің бөлігі, тапсырма бағытталған диалогтарындағы пайдаланушының параметрлерін мен шектерін (слоттарын) қадағалау үшін. Қызметтерді өзгерту үшін шын әлемдік параметрлерде, DST жүйелері жаңа домендерге жалпы болу керек және белгіленмеген слот түрлері. DST арқылы бар әдістер жаңа слоттың атауларына жақсы жасалмайды және көпшілігі слоттың түрлері мен мәндерінің беймәлім онтологиялары керек. Біз көп доменге тапсырма бағытталған диалогтарда табиғи тіл сұрауларын қолдау үшін онтологиялық бос фреймін келтіреміз. Біздің тәсіліміз сұрақ жауаптарына негізделген шарт тіл үлгісін алдын- ала оқылған ағылшын сөздеріне негізделген. Біздің үлгіміз нөл- шоу домендің адаптациялау параметрлерінде біріктірілген мақсаттың дұрыстығын 9% (абсолютті) деп жасайды MultiWOZ 2.1 деректер жиынының алдыңғы орындау күйінде.', 'lt': 'Dialog State Tracking (DST), an integral part of modern dialog systems, aims to track user preferences and constraints (slots) in task-oriented dialogs.  In real-world settings with constantly changing services, DST systems must generalize to new domains and unseen slot types.  Esami DST metodai nepakankamai paplitę naujiems laiko tarpsnių pavadinimams ir daugeliui jų reikalingos žinomos laiko tarpsnių tipų ontologijos ir išvados vertės. Įdiegiame naują sistemą be ontologijos, kuria remiami gamtiniai kalbų klausimai dėl nematomų apribojimų ir laiko tarpsnių daugiadominiuose užduotims orientuotuose dialoguose. Mūsų požiūris grindžiamas kartotiniu klausimų atsakymu naudojant sąlyginį kalbos model į, iš anksto apmokytą esminiais anglų sakiniais. Mūsų modelis gerina bendro tikslumo tikslumą nulinio nuotraukos domeno pritaikymo nustatymuose iki 9 % (absoliučiu) palyginti su ankstesniu pažangiausiu MultiWOZ 2.1 duomenų rinkiniu.', 'hu': 'A modern párbeszédrendszerek szerves részét képező Dialog State Tracking (DST) célja a felhasználói preferenciák és korlátozások nyomon követése feladatorientált párbeszédablakokban. A valós világban folyamatosan változó szolgáltatásokkal rendelkező beállításokban a DST rendszereknek általánosítaniuk kell új domainekre és láthatatlan slot típusokra. A meglévő DST-módszerek nem általánosítják jól az új slot neveket, és sokan következtetéshez szükségesek a slot típusok és értékek ismert ontológiájára. Bemutatunk egy új ontológia-mentes keretrendszert, amely támogatja a természetes nyelvű lekérdezéseket a láthatatlan korlátozások és rések több tartományba tartozó feladatorientált párbeszédpanelen. Megközelítésünk generációs kérdésválaszon alapul, feltételes nyelvi modell segítségével, amely előzetesen angol mondatokra képzett. Modellünk akár 9%-kal javítja a közös célpontosságot a zéró lövéses tartomány adaptációs beállítások esetén, mint a MultiWOZ 2.1 adatkészlet korábbi korszerű adatai.', 'it': "Dialog State Tracking (DST), parte integrante dei moderni sistemi di dialogo, mira a tenere traccia delle preferenze e dei vincoli degli utenti (slot) nelle finestre di dialogo orientate alle attività. Nelle impostazioni del mondo reale con servizi in continua evoluzione, i sistemi DST devono generalizzare a nuovi domini e tipi di slot invisibili. I metodi esistenti per l'ora legale non si generalizzano bene ai nuovi nomi di slot e molti richiedono ontologie note di tipi di slot e valori per inferenza. Introducemo un nuovo framework privo di ontologia che supporta query in linguaggio naturale per vincoli e slot invisibili in dialoghi multi-dominio orientati alle attività. Il nostro approccio si basa sulla risposta generativa alle domande utilizzando un modello linguistico condizionale pre-addestrato su frasi inglesi sostanziali. Il nostro modello migliora la precisione degli obiettivi comuni nelle impostazioni di adattamento del dominio zero-shot fino al 9% (assoluto) rispetto al precedente stato dell'arte sul set di dati MultiWOZ 2.1.", 'ml': 'ഡയലോഗ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ട്രാക്കിംഗ് (DST), ആധുനിക ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റമുള്ള ഒരു സംഘമായ ഭാഗമാണു്, ജോലിക്കുള്ള ഡയലോഗിന്റെ മ നിരന്തരമായി മാറുന്ന സേവനങ്ങളുടെ യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോക സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d, ഡിഎസ്റ്റ് സിസ്റ്റം പുതിയ ഡോമെനെന്\u200dസിലേക്ക ഡിഎസ്റ്റിന്റെ നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d പുതിയ സ്ലോട്ടിന്റെ പേരുകളിലേക്ക് നന്നായി സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നില്ല. പുതിയ സ്ലോട്ട ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു നോവലിനെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത് സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നു. മറ്റു ഡോമെയിന്\u200d ജോലിയുട നമ്മുടെ സമ്പാദ്യം ജനററിവ് ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിന് അടിസ്ഥാനമാണ്. ഒരു നിശ്ചയമായ ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് വളരെ  നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്ന ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ക്രമീകരണ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സഹജമായ ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്റെ കൂടുതല്\u200d 9% (absolute) മുമ്പ് മിടുക്കുന്ന സ്ഥാ', 'ms': 'Dialog State Tracking (DST), bahagian integral sistem dialog modern, bermaksud mengesan keutamaan pengguna dan keterangan (slot) dalam dialog oriented tugas. Dalam tetapan dunia-nyata dengan perkhidmatan yang berubah terus-menerus, sistem DST mesti umumkan kepada domain baru dan jenis slot tidak terlihat. Kaedah yang wujud untuk DST tidak menyebarkan dengan baik kepada nama slot baru dan banyak memerlukan ontologi yang diketahui jenis slot dan nilai untuk kesimpulan. Kami memperkenalkan kerangka bebas ontologi yang menyokong pertanyaan bahasa semulajadi untuk batasan dan slot yang tidak terlihat dalam dialog yang mengarah tugas-domain berbilang. pendekatan kita berdasarkan menjawab soalan generatif menggunakan model bahasa bersyarat dilatih-dilatih pada kalimat bahasa Inggeris substantif. Model kami meningkatkan ketepatan tujuan kongsi dalam tetapan penyesuaian domain 0-shot dengan sehingga 9% (mutlak) atas keadaan-kemajuan terdahulu pada set data MultiWOZ 2.1.', 'mt': 'Id-Djalogu dwar it-Traċċar mill-Istat (DST), parti integrali mis-sistemi moderni tad-djalogu, għandu l-għan li jsegwi l-preferenzi u l-limitazzjonijiet tal-utenti (slots) fid-djalogi orjentati lejn ix-xogħol. F’ambjenti reali b’servizzi li jinbidlu b’mod kostanti, is-sistemi DST għandhom jiġġeneralizzaw għal dominji ġodda u tipi ta’ slots mhux osservati. Il-metodi eżistenti għad-DST ma jiġġeneralizzawx tajjeb għal ismijiet ġodda ta’ slots u ħafna jeħtieġu ontoloġiji magħrufa ta’ tipi ta’ slots u valuri għall-inferenza. Aħna nintroduċu qafas ġdid ħieles mill-ontoloġija li jappoġġja mistoqsijiet lingwistiċi naturali għal restrizzjonijiet u slots mhux osservati f’djalogi orjentati lejn kompiti f’diversi oqsma. L-approċċ tagħna huwa bbażat fuq tweġibiet ġenerattivi għall-mistoqsijiet bl-użu ta’ mudell ta’ lingwa kondizzjonali mħarreġ minn qabel fuq sentenzi sostantivi bl-Ingliż. Il-mudell tagħna jtejjeb il-preċiżjoni tal-mira konġunta fl-ambjenti tal-adattament tad-dominju b’żero-shot b’sa 9% (assolut) fuq l-aħħar avvanz fis-sett tad-dejta MultiWOZ 2.1.', 'pl': 'Dialog State Tracking (DST), integralna część nowoczesnych systemów dialogowych, ma na celu śledzenie preferencji i ograniczeń użytkowników (slotów) w dialogach zorientowanych na zadania. W świecie rzeczywistym z ciągle zmieniającymi się usługami systemy DST muszą uogólniać się na nowe domeny i niewidoczne typy slotów. Istniejące metody DST nie uogólniają się dobrze do nowych nazw slotów i wiele z nich wymaga znanych ontologii typów slotów i wartości do wnioskowania. Wprowadzamy nowatorski framework wolny od ontologii, który obsługuje zapytania języka naturalnego dla niewidocznych ograniczeń i slotów w dialogach zorientowanych na zadania wielu domenach. Nasze podejście opiera się na generatywnym odpowiadaniu na pytania z wykorzystaniem warunkowego modelu językowego wstępnie przeszkolonego na merytorycznych zdaniach angielskich. Nasz model poprawia dokładność wspólnego celu w ustawieniach adaptacji domeny zero-shot o maksymalnie 9% (absolutny) w porównaniu z poprzednim najnowocześniejszym zestawem danych MultiWOZ 2.1.', 'mn': 'Диалог Улс Холбоо (DST), орчин үеийн диалог системийн нэг хэсэг, хэрэглэгчийн сонголтуудыг болон хязгаарлалтыг (слотуудыг) дагуулах зорилго юм. ДНХ-ийн системүүд шинэ зохиолууд болон харагдахгүй слотын төрлүүд рүү нийтлэгдэх хэрэгтэй. DST-ийн сууж байгаа арга нь шинэ слотын нэр дээр сайн нийтлэгддэггүй ба олон нь слотын төрөл болон үнэ цэнэтэй онтологи хэрэгтэй. Бид олон холбоотой ажлын ориентиролт диалогуудын байгалийн хэл хязгаарлалууд болон слотуудыг дэмжиж буй онтологиос чөлөөлөгүй шүүмжлэг бий болгодог. Бидний арга баримт асуулт хариултын үндсэн байдал нь үндсэн Англи хэлний өгүүлбэр дээр сургалтын өмнө сургалтын загвар ашиглаж байдаг. Бидний загварын загвар нь цөл шүдний загварын загварын зөв тохиромжтой байдлыг олон WOZ 2.1 өгөгдлийн сангийн өмнөх урлагийн хувьд 9% (абсолют) хүртэл нэмэгдүүлдэг.', 'mk': 'Dialog State Tracking (DST), an integral part of modern dialog systems, aims to track user preferences and constraints (slots) in task-oriented dialogs.  Во реалните поставувања со постојано менувачки услуги, ДСТ системите мора да се генерализираат на нови домени и невидени типови на слотови. Постојаните методи за ДСТ не се генерализираат добро на новите имиња на слотови и многумина бараат познати онтологии на типови на слотови и вредности за конференција. Ние воведуваме нова рамка без онтологија која ги поддржува природните прашања за јазик за невидени ограничувања и слотови во дијалози ориентирани на мултидомени задачи. Нашиот пристап е базиран на генерационално одговорување на прашања користејќи условен јазички модел предобучен на суштински англиски реченици. Нашиот модел ја подобрува точноста на заедничката цел во поставувањата за адаптација на доменот со нула снимка за до 9 отсто (апсолутно) во однос на претходната современа состојба на податоците MultiWOZ 2.1.', 'ro': 'Urmărirea stării dialogului (DST), parte integrantă a sistemelor moderne de dialog, urmărește urmărirea preferințelor și constrângerilor utilizatorilor (sloturi) în dialogurile orientate spre sarcini. În setările din lumea reală cu servicii în continuă schimbare, sistemele DST trebuie să generalizeze la domenii noi și tipuri de sloturi nevăzute. Metodele existente pentru ora orară nu generalizează bine la numele de sloturi noi și multe necesită ontologii cunoscute ale tipurilor de sloturi și valorilor pentru deducere. Introducem un nou cadru fără ontologie care acceptă interogări în limbaj natural pentru constrângeri nevăzute și sloturi în dialoguri orientate spre activități multi-domeniu. Abordarea noastră se bazează pe răspunsul generativ la întrebări folosind un model de limbă condiționată pre-instruit pe propoziții substanțiale în limba engleză. Modelul nostru îmbunătățește acuratețea obiectivelor comune în setările de adaptare a domeniului zero-shot cu până la 9% (absolut) față de starea anterioară a setului de date MultiWOZ 2.1.', 'no': 'Dialogtilstand-sporing (DST), ein integral del av moderne dialogsystemer, mål å spora brukarar-innstillingar og begrensningar (plassar) i oppgåvelinjeringsdialogar. I verkeleg innstillingar med permanent endring av tenester må DST- systemet generellisere til nye domene og ikkje- sett plassetypar. Det eksisterande metodane for DST er ikkje generellisert godt til nye plastnamn og mange krev kjente ontologiar av slotttypar og verdiar for infeksjon. Vi introduserer eit nytt ontologisk fritt rammeverk som støttar naturleg språkkspørjingar for ukjende begrensningar og plasser i multidomeneoppgåveorientert dialogvindauge. Tilnærminga vårt er basert på generert spørsmål-svar med ein betydelig språk-modell som først treng på substantive engelsk setningar. Modellen vårt forbetrar samanligste målsakritet i tilpassingsinnstillingane for domenet med nullstatt til 9% (absolutt) over den førre kunsttilstanden på datasettet MultiWOZ 2.1.', 'so': "Dialog State Tracking (DST), an integral part of modern dialog systems, aims to track user preferences and constraints (slots) in task-oriented dialogs.  Xaaladaha caalamiga ee joogtada ah ee adeegyada beddelaya, nidaamka DST waa in ay u soo bandhigaan meelaha cusub iyo noocyada bannaan ee qarsoon. Wadamada joogta ah ee DST si wanaagsan uma soo bandhigaan magaca cusub ee bannaanka, qaar badanna waxay u baahan yihiin noocyada bannaanka iyo qiimaha aan la garanayn. Waxaannu soo bandhignaynaa qoraal aan la’aan ah oo taageeraya su’aalaha afka dabiicadda ah oo ku qoran qasabka qarsoon iyo qalloocyada ku qoran dialog-horaadka shaqada oo kala duduwan. Dhaqdhaqaalkayagu waxay ku saleysan tahay jawaabta su'aalaha geneeral ee lagu isticmaalayo tusaale ahaan afka sharciga ah oo horay loo tababaray hadalka ingiriisiga ee muhiimka ah. Tusaalkayaga ayaa kordhiya saxda goalka wadajirka ah oo ku qoran saxda bedelka gudaha nuurka ah oo lagu bedelay 9% (absolute) oo ka horeysa xaaladdii hore ee sanadka ee MultiWOZ 2.1.", 'si': 'සංවාදය ස්ථානය පරීක්ෂණය (DST), අධ්\u200dයානය සංවාදය පද්ධතියේ සංවාදය අංක්\u200dරිය කොටසක්, ප්\u200dරයෝජකයේ අභ්\u200dයාගකය අ ඇත්ත ලෝක සැකසුම් සඳහා සේවාව වෙනස් කරන්න, DST පද්ධතිය අළුත් ඩෝමේන් වලට සහ ස්ලෝට් වර්ගයකට සාමාන්\u200dය වෙන් DST සඳහා තියෙන්න තියෙන විදිහට අළුත් ස්ලෝට් නම් වලට හොඳට සාමාන්\u200dයය කරන්නේ නැහැ සහ ගොඩක් ස්ලෝට් වර්ගයක් සහ අ අපි නිර්දේශ කතාවක් අන්තර්ජනය නිදහස් ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ප්\u200dරවේශ කරනවා ඒ වගේම ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා අනතු අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පිළිගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ. ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වචන අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක අරමුණ හරියට සුන්ධ වෙඩි තියෙන්නේ සුන්ධ වෙඩි තියෙන්නේ ඩෝමින් සැකසුම් සැකසුම් වලට 9% (නිර්මාණික) වෙඩි', 'sr': 'Диалог Диалог Наслеђање штата (DST), независим део совредних диалогових система, цели је да следи преференције и ограничања користи (места) у диалоговима ориентираним на задаче. U stvarnom svetskom postavku sa stalno mijenjanjem usluga, DST sistemi moraju generalizirati u nove domene i nevidljive vrste slota. Postoje metode DST-a ne generalizuju dobro na nove imena slota i mnogi zahtevaju poznate ontologije tipa slota i vrijednosti infekcije. Predstavljamo novi okvir bez ontologije koji podržava prirodne ispitivanja jezika za nevidljive ograničenja i mesta u multidomeničkim dijalogima orijentiranim zadacima. Naš pristup je baziran na generativnom odgovoru na pitanje koristeći uvjetni jezički model predobučen na temeljnim engleskim rečenicama. Naš model poboljšava tačnost zajedničkog cilja u postavkama adaptacije domena nula snimanja do 9% (apsolutno) u prethodnom stanju umjetnosti na multiWOZ 2.1 podataka.', 'sv': 'Dialogtillståndsspårning (DST), en integrerad del av moderna dialogsystem, syftar till att spåra användarpreferenser och begränsningar (slots) i uppgiftsorienterade dialogrutor. I verkliga miljöer med ständigt föränderliga tjänster måste DST-system generalisera till nya domäner och osynliga kortplatser. Befintliga metoder för DST generaliserar inte bra till nya slots namn och många kräver kända ontologier av slots typer och värden för slutsatser. Vi introducerar ett nytt ontologifritt ramverk som stöder naturliga språkfrågor för osynliga begränsningar och platser i flerdomäns uppgiftsorienterade dialoger. Vårt tillvägagångssätt bygger på generativt frågesvar med hjälp av en villkorad språkmodell som tränas i förväg på materiella engelska meningar. Vår modell förbättrar den gemensamma målnoggrannheten i inställningar för noll-skott domänanpassning med upp till 9% (absolut) jämfört med den tidigare toppmoderna datauppsättningen MultiWOZ 2.1.', 'ur': 'Dialog State Tracking (DST), a integral part of modern dialog systems, aims to track user preferences and constraints (slots) in task-oriented dialogs. سیستموں کے ساتھ ہمیشہ تغییر دینے کے ساتھ حقیقی دنیا کے سیٹیوں میں، DST سیستموں کو نئی ڈومین اور غیر جانے والی اسلوٹ کیسٹوں میں عامل کرنا چاہیے۔ DST کے مطابق موجود طریقے نیوی اسلوٹ ناموں میں اچھی طریقے نہیں لگاتے اور بہت سے لوگ اسلوٹ طریقوں اور منزلیں کے معلوم ہیں۔ ہم نے ایک نوم ontology-free frameworks کو معرفی کرتا ہے جو مختلف ڈومین کے کام-oriented ڈالیوں میں غیب کی محدودیت اور اسلوٹوں کے لئے طبیعی زبان کی سوال کی مدد کرتا ہے. ہمارا طریقہ ایک مستقل زبان کی مدل کے مطابق ایک مستقل انگلیسی جماعت پر آموزش کی جاتی ہے۔ ہمارا موڈل صفر-شٹ ڈومین اڈیسٹ سٹینٹوں میں جو پہلے آرتی کی حالت پر 9% (بالکل) تک پہنچ رہا ہے۔', 'ta': 'உரையாடல் நாட்டு பின்பற்றி (DST), தற்போதைய உரையாடல் முறைமைகளின் ஒரு தனிப்பட்ட பகுதி, செயல் திசையில் உள்ள உரையாடலில் பயனர் முன்னுரிமைகள் மற் நிலையாக மாறும் சேவைகளுடன் உண்மையான உலக அமைப்புகளில், DST அமைப்புகள் புதிய களங்களுக்கும் மற்றும் மறையாத செருகுவ DST க்கான இருக்கும் முறைகள் புதிய செருகுப்பு பெயர்களுக்கு நன்றாக உருவாக்காது மற்றும் பலருக்கு தெரியும் சுருக்கு வகைகள நாம் ஒரு புதிய அறிவிப்பு அறிவிப்பு மொழி கேள்விகளை ஆதரிக்கும் புதிய முறைமையை அறிவிப்போம் மற்றும் செருகுகளை பல டோமைன் பணி மு நிலைமையான மொழி மாதிரி முன் பயிற்சி முன்பு ஆங்கில வாக்கியங்களை பயன்படுத்தி பொதுவான கேள்வி பதில் அடிப்படைய எங்கள் மாதிரி சூழ்நிலையில் சேர்க்கப்பட்ட இலக்கு சரிபார்ப்பை மேம்படுத்துகிறது பூச்சியமாக்கப்பட்ட ட டோமென் அமைப்புகளில் 9% (absolute) முந்தைய ந', 'uz': "Name Name Name Biz oddiy tillar soʻrovlarini ko'plab-domen vazifalar bilan boshqarish muloqat muloqat muloqat muloqat muloqat oynalarda qoʻllanmaydi. Bizning fikrimiz birinchi muhim ingliz so'zlari bilan o'rganishdan oldin bir xil tilning javob beruvchi savol asosida. Bizning modelimiz muloWOZ 2. 1 maʼlumotlar tarkibida hech narsa oʻzgarishni notoʻgʻri domen oʻzgarishda 9% (abs) o'zgartiradi.", 'vi': 'Máy theo dõi bang Dialogo (DST) là một phần của hệ thống thoại hiện đại, nhằm theo dõi mục đích sử dụng và giới hạn (thời gian) trong các tạp chí hướng dẫn nhiệm vụ. Trong thế giới thực với dịch vụ thay đổi liên tục, hệ thống DSS phải tổng hợp thành những miền mới và những loại suất không nhìn thấy. Phương pháp tồn tại cho DSS không thể tổng hợp tốt với tên mới và nhiều người cần có các dạng có khe hở và giá trị để nhận tội. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một cơ sở không khoa học mới hỗ trợ các câu hỏi ngôn ngữ tự nhiên về giới hạn không nhìn thấy và các khe trong các cuộc họp phụ thuộc nhiều miền. Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi dựa trên việc trả lời câu hỏi hệ thống bằng cách sử dụng mô hình ngôn ngữ phụ thuộc. Mô hình của chúng ta cải thiện độ chính xác mục chung trong thiết lập thích hợp miền không bắn bằng tới 9= (tuyệt đối) so với lần trước thời trang trên tập tin đa WOZ 2.1.', 'hr': 'Državni praćenje dijaloga (DST), integralni dio modernih dijalogskih sustava, cilj je pratiti preferencije i ograničenja korisnika u dijalogima orientiranim na zadatke. U realnim svijetskim postavkama sa stalno mijenjanjem usluga, DST sustavi moraju generalizirati u nove domene i nevidljive vrste slota. Postoje metode DST-a ne generalizuju dobro na nove imena slota i mnogi zahtijevaju poznate ontologije tipa slota i vrijednosti infekcije. Predstavljamo novi okvir bez ontologije koji podržava prirodne ispitivanja jezika za nevidljive ograničenja i mjesta u multidomeničkim dijalogima orientiranim zadacima. Naš pristup je temeljen na generativnom odgovoru na pitanje koristeći uvjetni jezički model predobučen na temeljnim engleskim kaznama. Naš model poboljšava preciznost zajedničkog cilja u postavkama prilagodbe domena nula snimanja do 9% (apsolutno) u prethodnom stanju umjetnosti u multiWOZ 2.1 podataka.', 'bg': 'Проследяване на състоянието на диалоговия прозорец (ДТ), неразделна част от съвременните диалогови системи, има за цел проследяване на предпочитанията и ограниченията на потребителите (слотове) в ориентирани към задачите диалогови прозорци. В реални настройки с постоянно променящи се услуги, системите трябва да се обобщават към нови домейни и невидими слотове типове. Съществуващите методи за ДСТ не се обобщават добре към нови слотове имена и много от тях изискват известни онтологии на слотове типове и стойности за заключение. Въвеждаме нова рамка, свободна от онтология, която поддържа заявки за естествен език за невидими ограничения и слотове в многодомейни задачи ориентирани диалози. Нашият подход се основава на генеративно отговаряне на въпроси, използвайки условен езиков модел, предварително обучен на материални английски изречения. Нашият модел подобрява точността на съвместните цели в настройките за адаптация на домейна нулев изстрел с до 9% (абсолютно) в сравнение с предишните най-съвременни технологии на набора от данни.', 'da': 'Dialog State Tracking (DST), som er en integreret del af moderne dialogsystemer, har til formål at spore brugerpræferencer og begrænsninger (slots) i opgaveorienterede dialoger. I virkelighedens indstillinger med konstant skiftende tjenester skal DST-systemer generalisere til nye domæner og usynlige slots typer. Eksisterende metoder til DST generaliserer ikke godt til nye slots navne, og mange kræver kendte ontologier af slots typer og værdier for at udlede deres udtalelse. Vi introducerer en ny ontologi-fri ramme, der understøtter naturlige sprogforespørgsler for usynlige begrænsninger og slots i opgaveorienterede dialoger med flere domæner. Vores tilgang er baseret på generativ spørgsmålsbesvarelse ved hjælp af en betinget sprogmodel, der er prætrænet på substantielle engelske sætninger. Vores model forbedrer nøjagtigheden af fælles mål i nulskudsdomænetilpasningsindstillinger med op til 9% (absolut) i forhold til den tidligere state-of-the-art på MultiWOZ 2.1 datasættet.', 'id': 'Dialog State Tracking (DST), bagian integral dari sistem dialog modern, bermaksud melacak keutamaan pengguna dan batasan (slots) dalam dialog oriented tugas. Dalam pengaturan dunia nyata dengan layanan yang terus berubah, sistem DST harus menyebarkan ke domain baru dan tipe slot yang tidak terlihat. Metode yang ada untuk DST tidak mendeneralisasi dengan baik untuk nama slot baru dan banyak membutuhkan ontologi dikenal dari tipe slot dan nilai untuk kesimpulan. Kami memperkenalkan rangkaian bebas ontologi yang mendukung pertanyaan bahasa alami untuk batasan dan slot yang tidak terlihat dalam dialog multi domain yang mengarientasi tugas. pendekatan kita berdasarkan menjawab pertanyaan generatif menggunakan model bahasa kondisional yang dilatih pada kalimat bahasa Inggris substantif. Our model improves joint goal accuracy in zero-shot domain adaptation settings by up to 9% (absolute) over the previous state-of-the-art on the MultiWOZ 2.1 dataset.', 'nl': "Dialogstate Tracking (DST), een integraal onderdeel van moderne dialoogsystemen, heeft tot doel gebruikersvoorkeuren en beperkingen (slots) bij te houden in taakgerichte dialoogvensters. In real-world omgevingen met voortdurend veranderende diensten moeten DST-systemen generaliseren naar nieuwe domeinen en ongeziene slottypen. Bestaande methoden voor DST generaliseren niet goed naar nieuwe slotnamen en veel vereisen bekende ontologieën van slottypen en waarden voor inferentie. We introduceren een nieuw ontologievrij framework dat natuurlijke taalquery's ondersteunt voor ongeziene beperkingen en slots in taakgerichte dialoogvensters met meerdere domeinen. Onze aanpak is gebaseerd op generatief vragenbeantwoorden met behulp van een voorwaardelijk taalmodel dat vooraf is getraind op inhoudelijke Engelse zinnen. Ons model verbetert de nauwkeurigheid van het gezamenlijke doel in zero-shot domein aanpassingsinstellingen met maximaal 9% (absoluut) ten opzichte van de vorige state-of-the-art op de MultiWOZ 2.1 dataset.", 'fa': 'ردیابی وضعیت محاورۀ محاورۀ دیalog (DST) یک بخشی از سیستم محاورۀ محاورۀ مدرن، هدف برای ردیابی گزینه\u200cهای کاربر و محدودیت\u200cها (محدودیت) در محاورۀ مرکز کار است. در تنظیمات دنیای واقعی با همیشه تغییر خدمات، سیستم\u200cهای DST باید به دامنهای جدید و نوع نقطه\u200cهای غیرقابل تغییر دهند. روش\u200cهای موجود برای DST به نام\u200cهای نقطه\u200cای جدید نیازمند نیستند و بسیاری از آن\u200cتولوژی\u200cهای شناخته\u200cشده از نوع نقطه\u200cها و ارزش\u200cهای نقطه\u200cای برای بیماری نیاز دارند. ما یک چهارچوب روزنامه\u200cای آزاد ontology را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که از سوال زبان طبیعی برای محدودیت و محدودیت غیرقابل مشاهده در محدودیت\u200cهای مشاهده\u200cشده\u200cی مشاهده\u200cهای مطالعه\u200cهای زیادی از دامنه\u200c روش ما بر پایه جواب سوال\u200cهای ژنترافی با استفاده از مدل زبان شرایط پیش آموزش داده شده بر جمله\u200cهای انگلیسی پایه\u200cای است. مدل ما دقیقات هدف مشترک را در تنظیمات تغییرات دامنی صفر به حدود ۹ درصد (مطلق) در حالت پیشین هنر در مجموعه داده\u200cهای MultiWOZ 2.1 بهتر می\u200cکند.', 'de': 'Dialog State Tracking (DST), ein integraler Bestandteil moderner Dialogsysteme, zielt darauf ab, Benutzerpräferenzen und Einschränkungen (Slots) in aufgabenorientierten Dialogen zu verfolgen. In realen Umgebungen mit ständig wechselnden Diensten müssen DST-Systeme auf neue Domänen und unsichtbare Slot-Typen verallgemeinern. Bestehende Methoden für DST verallgemeinern sich nicht gut auf neue Slot-Namen und viele erfordern bekannte Ontologien von Slot-Typen und -Werten für die Inferenz. Wir stellen ein neuartiges ontologiefreies Framework vor, das natürliche Sprachabfragen nach unsichtbaren Einschränkungen und Slots in aufgabenorientierten Dialogen mit mehreren Domänen unterstützt. Unser Ansatz basiert auf der generativen Beantwortung von Fragen mit einem konditionalen Sprachmodell, das auf inhaltlichen englischen Sätzen vortrainiert wurde. Unser Modell verbessert die gemeinsame Zielgenauigkeit in Null-Schuss-Domänenanpassungseinstellungen um bis zu 9% (absolut) gegenüber dem bisherigen Stand der Technik auf dem MultiWOZ 2.1 Datensatz.', 'tr': 'Dialog durum Jemi (DST), modern dijal sistemleriniň integral bir bölegi, ullançylaryň tercihleri we çykyşlaryny görkezmek üçin amaçlarýar. Hat dünýä düzümlerde sürekli servisleri üýtgetmek bilen, DST sistemleri täze alanlary we slot hillerine döredilmeli. DST üçin bar döwletler täze slot adlaryny bejermek üçin has gowy döwletlenmeýär we köpüsi ýerleşdirmek üçin bilinen slot türleri we deňleri gerek. Biz multi-domenýä görkezilmedik çäreler we slotlar üçin tebigy dil soraglaryny destekleýän ontologiýadan boş bir roman çykarýarys. Biziň ýaryşymyz döredijili soraglaryň jogabyna mümkin dil nusgasyny Iňlisçe sözlerine öň-öňden öňden öňden öňden öňden öňden öňden öňden öňden gelen şekilde daýanýar. Biziň modelimiz kop maksadyň dogrylygyny MultiWOZ 2.1 veri setirinde 9% (absolut) ýagdaýynda 0-aty ajaýyp düzümlerni üstine gelişýär.', 'af': "Dialoog Staat Volg (DST), 芒聙聶n integraal deel van moderne dialoog stelsels, doel om gebruiker voorkeure en beheinings (slots) in taak- orienteerde dialoog te snit. In re毛l- w锚reld instellings met konstantelik verander dienste, moet DST stelsels generaliseer na nuwe domeine en ongestelde slot tipes. Bestaande metodes vir DST doen nie goed genereer na nuwe slot naams en baie benodig bekende ontologies van slot tipes en waardes vir inferensie. Ons introduseer 'n roman ontologie-vry raamwerk wat ondersteun natuurlike taal navraag vir ongesiende beheinings en slote in multidomein taak-orienteerde dialoog. Ons toegang is gebaseer op genereer vraag- antwoord met 'n voorbeeld taal model wat vooraf opgelei is op substantiewe Engelse setinge. Ons model verbeter die saamste doel waarskynlik in nul-skoot domein aanpassing instellings deur tot 9% (absoluut) oor die vorige staat-van-kuns op die MultiWOZ 2.1 datastel.", 'sw': 'Ufuatiliaji wa Taifa la Dialog (DST), sehemu ya mfumo wa mazungumzo ya kisasa, ina lengo la kufuatilia upendeleo wa watumiaji na vikwazo (vipande) katika mazungumzo yenye kazi. In real-world settings with constantly changing services, DST systems must generalize to new domains and unseen slot types.  Utawala uliopo wa DST hautengenezea vizuri kwa majina mapya ya simu na wengi wanahitaji utambulisho wa aina za viwanja na thamani za kupunguzwa. Tunaweza kutengeneza mfumo wa riwaya isiyo na utafiti wa lugha za asili kwa vizuizi na vidole vya siri katika mazungumzo yanayomilikiwa na majadiliano mengi ya ndani. Hatua yetu inatokana na maswali ya kizalendo kwa kutumia mifano ya lugha ya kizuizi yaliyofundishwa kabla ya kuhamasisha hukumu za Kiingereza. Mfano wetu unaboresha uhakika wa malengo ya pamoja katika mazingira ya kuboresha huduma za ndani isiyo na risasi kwa kufikia asilimia 9 (muhimu) katika hali ya sanaa iliyopita kwenye seti ya takwimu za MultiWOZ 2.1.', 'hy': 'Պատկերացուցիչների նախընտրությունների և սահմանափակումների հետևումը (DST), ժամանակակից խոսքի համակարգերի անկախ մասն է, նպատակով է հետևել գործողների նախընտրություններին և սահմանափակումներին գործողությունների ուղղությամբ։ Իրական աշխարհի միջավայրում, որտեղ անընդհատ փոփոխվում են ծառայությունները, DST համակարգերը պետք է ընդհանրացվեն նոր տիպի և անտեսանելի վայրերի տիպի: DST-ի գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդները լավ չեն ընդհանրացնում նոր անվանումների համար, և շատ անհրաժեշտ են անվանել անվանումների տիպերի և արժեքների հայտնի օնտոլոգիաներ հետեւանքների համար: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր անգիտակցական շրջանակ, որը աջակցում է բնական լեզվի հարցերին անտեսանելի սահմանափակումների և վայրերի համար բազմաբնագավառներով աշխատանքների ուղղությամբ գտնվող հատվածներում: Մեր մոտեցումը հիմնված է սերունդային հարցերի պատասխանների վրա՝ օգտագործելով պայմանավոր լեզվի մոդել, որը նախապատրաստված է անգլերենի նյութական նախադասությունների վրա: Մեր մոդելը բարելավում է ընդհանուր նպատակի ճշգրիտությունը զրոյի ոլորտի ադապտացիայի համակարգերում մինչև 9 տոկոսով (բացարձակ) բացարձակ տվյալների վերաբերյալ Մոլիվոզ 2.1 տվյալների համակարգի նախկին բարձրա', 'sq': 'Dialogu State Tracking (DST), një pjesë integrale e sistemeve moderne të dialogut, synon të gjurmojë preferimet dhe kufizimet e përdoruesit (slots) në dialogun e orientuar ndaj detyrave. Në rregullimet e botës reale me shërbime të ndryshuara vazhdimisht, sistemet DST duhet të gjeneralizohen në domene të reja dhe lloje slot të padukshme. Metodat ekzistuese për DST nuk gjeneralizojnë mirë emrat e slots të rinj dhe shumë kërkojnë ontologji të njohura të llojeve të slots dhe vlerave për përfundimin. Ne paraqesim një kuadër të ri pa ontologji që mbështet pyetjet natyrore të gjuhës për kufizime të padukshme dhe slots në dialoge të orientuara në punë në shumë domene. Përqasja jonë bazohet në përgjigjen gjenerative të pyetjeve duke përdorur një model gjuhësh të kushtueshme të stërvitur para-në fjalimet thelbësore angleze. Modeli ynë përmirëson saktësinë e objektivit të përbashkët në rregullimet e përshtatjes me zero-shot domain me deri në 9% (absolute) mbi gjendjen e mëparshme të teknologjisë në MultiWOZ 2.1 dataset.', 'am': "dialogs-action በሀገር ዓለም ውስጥ ሁኔታ የሚለውጡ አገልግሎቶች በመቀላቀል፣ DST ስርዓቶች አዲስ ሰፈር እና ያልታወቀ ስርዓት ዓይነቶች እንዲያስተካክሉ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s አዲስ የቋንቋ ጥያቄዎችን ለመደገፍ እና ለመደገፍ ለብዙ ዶሜን ስራ በተደረገ መክፈቻ የሚረዳውን የኖሮሎሎጂ ነጻ ፍሬማር እናስጠጋለን፡፡ የዘረኝነት ጥያቄ መልስ በመጠቀም ላይ ነው፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን የክፍለ አካል አካሄዱን በክፍለ አዲስ ዶሜን አካባቢ አካባቢ 9 በመቶ (absolut) በሚያሳድገው ብዙኃን በሁለት.1 ዳታ ማዕከል ላይ ነው፡፡", 'bn': 'ডায়ালগ স্টেট ট্র্যাক্কিং (DST), আধুনিক ডায়ালগ সিস্টেমের একটি পূর্ণ অংশ, যার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে কাজের দিকের ডায়ালগের ব্যবহারকারীর পছন্দ ও ন বাস্তব বিশ্বের বৈশ্বিক বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীতে সার্ভিস পরিবর্তনের সাথে ডিএসটি সিস্টেম নতুন ডোমেইন এবং অদৃশ্য স্লোট ট ডিএসটির বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি নতুন স্লোটের নামের জন্য ভালোভাবে সাধারণ করে না এবং অনেকে স্লোটের ধরন ও মানের পরিচিত প্রয়োজন। আমরা একটি উপন্যাস অনটলোজিক ফ্রেমের পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি যা অনেক অদৃশ্য বৈধ এবং স্ল্যাটের জন্য প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রশ্ন সমর্থন করে। আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা জেনারেটিভ প্রশ্নের উত্তরের ভিত্তিতে ভিত্তিতে রয়েছে একটি শর্তিক ভাষার মডেল ব্যবহার করে প্রশিক আমাদের মডেল মাল্টিউডওয়াজ ২. ১ ডাটাসেটের পূর্বের রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের মাধ্যমে পূর্বের ৯% (সম্পূর্ণ) পরিমাণের মাধ্যমে যৌথ লক্ষ্যের স', 'bs': 'Državni praćenje dijaloga (DST), integralni dio modernih dijalogskih sustava, cilj je pratiti preferencije i ograničenja korisnika u dijalogima orijentiranih na zadatke. U stvarnom svijetu sa stalno mijenjanjem usluga, DST sustavi moraju generalizirati u nove domene i nevidljive vrste slota. Postoje metode DST-a ne generalizuju dobro na nove imena slota i mnogi zahtijevaju poznate ontologije tipa slota i vrijednosti infekcije. Predstavljamo novi okvir bez ontologije koji podržava prirodne ispitivanja jezika za nevidljive ograničenja i slobode u multidomeničkim dijalogima orientiranim zadacima. Naš pristup je baziran na generativnom odgovoru na pitanje koristeći uvjetni jezički model predobučen na temeljnim engleskim rečenicama. Naš model poboljšava tačnost zajedničkog cilja u postavkama adaptacije domena nula snimanja do 9% (apsolutno) tokom prethodnog stanja umjetnosti u multiWOZ 2.1 podataka.', 'ko': '대화 상태 추적(DST)은 현대 대화 시스템의 한 구성 부분으로 임무를 향한 대화에서 사용자의 선호와 제약(시간 간격)을 추적하기 위한 것이다.서비스가 끊임없이 변화하는 현실 환경에서 DST 시스템은 반드시 새로운 영역과 보이지 않는 슬롯 유형으로 확대해야 한다.기존의 DST 방법은 새로운 슬롯 이름으로 잘 보급되지 못하기 때문에 많은 방법들이 슬롯 유형과 값의 이미 알고 있는 본체를 필요로 한다.우리는 자연 언어 조회 다영역 임무를 위한 대화상자에서 볼 수 없는 제약과 플러그인을 지원하는 새로운 무본체 프레임워크를 소개했다.우리의 방법은 생성적인 문제 대답을 바탕으로 미리 훈련된 조건 언어 모델을 이용하여 실질적인 영어 문장에 대답하는 것이다.이전 MultiWOZ 2.1 데이터 세트의 최신 기술에 비해 우리의 모델은 제로 렌즈 영역이 설정에 적응하는 연합 목표 정밀도를 9%(절대치) 향상시켰다.', 'cs': 'Sledování stavu dialogů (DST), nedílnou součástí moderních dialogových systémů, si klade za cíl sledovat uživatelské preference a omezení (sloty) v dialogových oknech orientovaných na úkoly. V reálném světě s neustále se měnícími službami se systémy DST musí zobecňovat na nové domény a neviděné typy slotů. Stávající metody DST se nezobecňují dobře na nové jména slotů a mnoho z nich vyžaduje známé ontologie typů slotů a hodnot pro inferenci. Představujeme nový ontologický framework, který podporuje dotazy přirozeného jazyka pro neviditelná omezení a sloty v dialogových dialogech orientovaných na úlohy více domén. Náš přístup je založen na generativním odpovědi na otázky s využitím podmíněného jazykového modelu předškoleného na obsahových anglických větách. Náš model zlepšuje přesnost společného cíle v nastavení adaptace domény nulového výstřelu až o 9% (absolutní) oproti předchozímu stavu techniky na datové sadě MultiWOZ 2.1.', 'az': 'Dialoog Eyalet İzləməsi (DST), moderni Dialoog sistemlərin integral bir parçası, işlər tərəfindən istifadəçi seçimləri və çətinləri (slot) ilə istifadə etmək istəyir. Əbədi dünya qurğuları dəyişdirmək üçün, DST sistemləri yeni domenalara və qeyri-qeyri slot türünə generalizlənməlidir. DST üçün mövcuddur metodlar yeni slot adlarına yaxşı işləməz və çoxların bilən slot türünün və qiymətlərinin ontologilərinə ehtiyacı yoxdur. Biz çoxlu-domenə tərəfindən gizlənməyən çətinlər və slotlar barəsində təbiətli dil soruşmalarını dəstəkləyən yeni ontoloji boş bir framework ü təşkil edirik. Bizim tərzimiz məsələlərdən əvvəl təhsil edilmiş İngilizə cümlələrdə təhsil edilmiş şəkildə dil modeli vasitəsilə generiki sual cavabına dayanır. Bizim modelimiz, çoxlu WOZ 2.1 veri qutusundakı əvvəlki məlumatın məlumatının məlumatının məqsədilə sıfır-shot domeinin uyğunlaşdırması tərzlərində 9% (absolut) qədər yaxşılaşdırır.', 'ca': "Dialog State Tracking (DST), part integral dels sistemes moderns de diàleg, té l'objectiu de seguir les preferències i restriccions dels usuaris (slots) en diàlegs orientats a les tasques. En entorns del món real amb serveis constantment canviants, els sistemes DST s'han de generalitzar a nous dominis i tipus de slots invisibles. Els mètodes existents per a la TDS no s'generalitzen bé als nous noms de slots i molts requereixen ontologies conegudes de tipus de slots i valors per a la inferència. Introduïm un nou marc lliure d'ontologia que suporta preguntes de llenguatge natural per restriccions i slots invisibles en diàlegs orientats a tasques multidominiosos. El nostre enfocament està basat en la resposta generativa a preguntes utilitzant un model de llenguatge condicionat entrenat previament en frases angleses substantives. El nostre model millora la precisió de l'objectiu conjunt en les configuracions d'adaptació de dominis amb fotografies zero fins al 9% (absoluta) en comparació amb l'estat d'avançat anterior del conjunt de dades MultiWOZ 2.1.", 'et': 'Dialoogi oleku jälgimise (DST), mis on kaasaegsete dialoogisüsteemide lahutamatu osa, eesmärk on jälgida kasutaja eelistusi ja piiranguid (pesasid) ülesannetele orienteeritud dialoogides. Alati muutuvate teenustega reaalmaailma seadetes peavad DST-süsteemid üldistama uutele domeenidele ja nähtamatutele pesatüüpidele. Olemasolevad DST meetodid ei üldista hästi uutele teenindusaegadele ja paljud nõuavad teadaolevaid teenindusaegade tüüpide ja väärtuste ontoloogiaid järelduste tegemiseks. Tutvustame uudset ontoloogiavaba raamistikku, mis toetab looduskeele päringuid nähtamatute piirangute ja teenindusaegade puhul mitmedomeenilistes ülesannetele orienteeritud dialoogides. Meie lähenemine põhineb generatiivsel küsimustele vastamisel, kasutades tingimuslikku keelemudelit, mis on eelnevalt koolitatud sisulistel inglise lausetel. Meie mudel parandab ühiseesmärgi täpsust null-shot domeeni kohandamise seadetes kuni 9% (absoluutne) võrreldes eelmise tehnika tasemega MultiWOZ 2.1 andmekogumi puhul.', 'fi': 'Dialog State Tracking (DST), joka on olennainen osa nykyaikaisia dialogijärjestelmiä, pyrkii seuraamaan käyttäjän asetuksia ja rajoituksia tehtävälähtöisissä valintaikkunoissa. Reaalimaailman asetuksissa, joissa palvelut muuttuvat jatkuvasti, DST-järjestelmien täytyy yleistyä uusiin verkkotunnuksiin ja näkymättömiin slottityypeihin. Nykyiset DST-menetelmät eivät yleisty hyvin uusille slottien nimille ja monet vaativat tunnettuja ontologioita slottityypeistä ja arvoista päättelyä varten. Esittelemme uuden ontologiavapaan kehyksen, joka tukee luonnollisen kielen kyselyjä näkymättömille rajoituksille ja sloteille monitoimialueisiin tehtäväsuuntautuneissa dialogeissa. Lähestymistapamme perustuu generatiiviseen kysymykseen vastaamiseen käyttämällä ehdollista kielimallia, joka on ennalta koulutettu aineellisiin englanninkielisiin lauseisiin. Mallimme parantaa yhteisen maalin tarkkuutta nollalaukauksen sovellusasetuksissa jopa 9% (absoluuttisesti) verrattuna aikaisempaan MultiWOZ 2.1 -aineistoon.', 'sk': 'Sledenje stanja pogovornega okna (DST), sestavni del sodobnih pogovornih sistemov, je namenjeno sledenju nastavitev in omejitev uporabnikov (rež) v pogovornih oknih, usmerjenih v opravila. V realnih okoljih s stalno spreminjajočimi se storitvami morajo sistemi DST posplošiti na nove domene in nevidne vrste rež. Obstoječe metode za DST se ne posplošujejo dobro na nova imena rež in mnogi zahtevajo znane ontologije vrst rež in vrednosti za sklepanje. Predstavljamo nov okvir brez ontologije, ki podpira poizvedbe v naravnem jeziku za nevidne omejitve in reže v večdomenskih pogovornih oknih, usmerjenih v opravila. Naš pristop temelji na generativnem odgovarjanju na vprašanja s pogojnim jezikovnim modelom, ki je predhodno usposobljen za vsebinske angleške stavke. Naš model izboljšuje natančnost skupnega cilja v nastavitvah prilagajanja ničelnega strela domene za do 9% (absolutno) v primerjavi s prejšnjimi najsodobnejšimi prilagoditvami podatkov MultiWOZ 2.1.', 'jv': 'Dialog state tracing (SST), an embedal parts of contextual dialog sistems, goal to track user preferences and limits (slots) in task-Orientation dialogs. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world We insert a new ontogram-free frame that supported normal language query for unseen limits and slots in multi-domain task-Orientation dialogs. Ndoleh dhéwé kuwi ngewehi mulai akeh suaraning-suaraning nggambar kelas kuwi model sing ditambah-suaraning kanggo nguasakno Inggris barang. We model advances joint goal exact in 0-shot domain modification settings by up to 9% (absolute) super the previous state-of-the-arts on the MultiWOZ 2.1 dataset.', 'ha': "Track State of Dialog (DS), wani raba guda na cikin tsarin zauren akwatin bayani na yanzu, yana amfani da ya bi'anar da zauren akwatin bayani na masu shirya da hanyoyi (slot) cikin zauren akwatin aiki-orin aiki. Daga daidaita-duniya da ke canza tsarin aiki daidai, sai na buƙata tsarin DSS ya zama mai ƙiƙiro zuwa nau'in sauran da ba'a sani ba. @ info: whatsthis Mu ƙara wani firam na nowaya wanda ba'a so ba, da yana ƙarfafa masu tambayar harshen kwance wa buƙata da baka baka cikin zauren akwatin aiki masu shirya multi-Domen. Mataimakinmu ne a kan mai bincike wa mai tambaya da ke amfani da misalin harshe na ƙayyade a gaba-wa'anar Ingiriya. Shiryoyinmu na ƙara tsarin shirin goal na haɗi cikin tsarin adaptori ɗin-shekara na sifiri zuwa 9% (cikakken) kan halin-mai gabani na zaman halin-da-sanar ta multi-WOZ 2.1.", 'he': 'דיאלוג מעקב המדינה (DST), חלק אינטגרלי של מערכות דיאלוג מודרניות, מכוון לעקוב אחר העדיפות והמחסומות של המשתמשים (slots) בדיולוגים ממוקדים למשימות. במסדרות בעולם האמיתי עם שירותים משתנים באופן קבוע, מערכות DST חייבות להתפשט לתחומים חדשים וסוגי קופסאות בלתי צפויים. שיטות קיימות לדי.אס.טי. לא מגנרליות היטב לשמות קופסאות חדשים ורבים דורשים אונטולוגיות ידועות של סוגי קופסאות וערכים למסקנה. אנחנו מציגים מסגר חדש ללא אונטולוגיה שמתמוך בשאלות טבעיות למגבלות בלתי נראות ובדיאלוגים ממיונים למשימות רבות דומיניות. הגישה שלנו מבוססת על תשובות לשאלות דוורתיות בשימוש מודל שפה תנאי מאומן מראש על משפטים אנגליים משמעותיים. הדוגמא שלנו משפר את מדויקת המטרה המשותפת בסגנון התאמה של שטח אפס של 9% (מוחלט) על המצב הקודם של המידע MultiWOZ 2.1.', 'bo': 'Dialog State Tracking (DST), an integral part of modern dialog systems, aims to track user preferences and constraints (slots) in task-oriented dialogs. In real-world settings with constantly changing services, DST systems must generalize to new domains and unseen slot types. གནས་ཡུལ་པའི་DST ལ་གནས་ཡུལ་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྒོ་སྒྲིག་མིང་གསར་བ We introduce a novel ontology-free framework that supports natural language queries for unseen constraints and slots in multi-domain task-oriented dialogs. ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་མཐུན་རྣམས་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་མིང་ཁག་ཅིག་གནད་སྡུད་པའི་ཚིག་རྣམས་མཐུན ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་བདེ་འཇལ་རིམ་འདྲ་བའི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ལ་ཉུང་ཡོད་པ་དང་ཕྱོགས་སྔོན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གཙོ་རིམ་དེ་ཡར་ཕྱོ'}
{'en': 'MIDAS : A Dialog Act Annotation Scheme for Open Domain HumanMachine Spoken Conversations', 'es': 'MIDAS: un esquema de anotación de la Ley de diálogo para conversaciones habladas humano-máquina de dominio', 'fr': "MIDAS\xa0: un schéma d'annotation Dialog Act pour les conversations orales homme-machine de domaine ouvert", 'pt': 'MIDAS: Um Esquema de Anotação de Ato de Diálogo para Conversas Faladas HumanMachine de Domínio Aberto', 'ar': 'MIDAS: مخطط التعليق التوضيحي لقانون الحوار للمحادثات المنطوقة بين الإنسان والآلة ذات المجال المفتوح', 'ja': 'MIDAS: Open Domain HumanMachine Spoken Conversationsのためのダイアログアクトアノテーションスキーム', 'hi': 'MIDAS: ओपन डोमेन HumanMachine स्पोकन वार्तालापों के लिए एक संवाद अधिनियम एनोटेशन योजना', 'zh': 'MIDAS:开域机器口语注方', 'ru': 'MIDAS: Аннотация к закону о диалоге для разговоров в открытом домене на человеко-машинах', 'ga': 'MIDAS: Scéim Anótála Acht Dialóige do Chomhráite i gCainteanna Fearainn Oscailte HumanMachine', 'el': 'Ένα πρόγραμμα σχολιασμού πράξεως διαλόγου για συζητήσεις ανοιχτού τομέα', 'hu': 'MIDAS: A Dialog Act Note Scheme for Open Domain HumanMachine Spoken Conversations', 'it': 'MIDAS: A Dialog Act annotation Scheme for Open Domain HumanMachine Spoken Conversations', 'kk': 'MIDAS: Ашық доменнің адаммашинаның сөйлесу үшін диалог аңдату сұлбасы', 'mk': 'MIDAS: Схема на анотации за Акт за дијалог за разговори за отворен домен', 'ms': 'MIDAS: Skema Annotasi Akt Dialog untuk Perbualan Cakap Manusia Domain Buka', 'ka': 'MIDAS: დიალოგის აკტის ანოტაციის სქემი გახსნა დომენის ადამიანმაქსის საუბარებისთვის', 'mt': 'MIDAS: Skema ta’ Annotazzjoni tal-Att ta’ Djalogu għal Konversjonijiet Miftuħa ta’ Domain HumanMachine Spoken', 'mn': 'MIDAS: Диалог хууль нь нээлттэй Домен Хүмүүсийн Машины Сүүлчийн Диалог Холбоо', 'pl': 'MIDAS: Dialog Act Annotation Scheme dla Open Domain HumanMachine Spoken Conversations', 'lt': 'MIDAS: Dialogo akto annotacijos schema atviro domeno žmogiškųjų mašinų kalbų pokalbiams', 'no': 'MIDAS: Eit dialogaktisk notasjonsskjema for oppgjevne omtaler for oppgjevne domenemaskin', 'ro': 'MIDAS: O schemă de adnotare a actului de dialog pentru conversațiile vorbite HumanMachine pe domeniu deschis', 'sr': 'MIDAS: Šema oznake za otvorene razgovore o humanoj mašini domena', 'si': 'MIDAS: සංවාද ක්\u200dරියාත්මක සංවාදයක් අරින්න ඩෝමේන් මිනිස් මාන්\u200dයමැෂින් සංවාදයක්', 'ml': 'മിഡാസ്: തുറക്കുന്ന ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d മനുഷ്യന്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു ഡയലോഗ് നിയമപ്രകൃതി പദ്ധതി', 'so': 'MIDAS: A Dialog Act Annotation Scheme for Open Domain HumanMachine Spoken Conversations', 'sv': 'MIDAS: A Dialog Act Annotation Scheme for Open Domain HumanMachine Spoken Conversations', 'ur': 'MIDAS: کھولنے کے لئے ایک ڈومین انسان ماشین صحبت کے لئے ایک ڈیلوگ اکتل انٹوریٹ اسکیم', 'ta': 'MIDAS: திறந்த டொமைன் மனிதன் பேசும் உரையாடல் விதிமுறைமை', 'uz': 'Machine Spoken Conversations', 'vi': 'Thiết lập giải thích cho cung rộng Nhân Bản Máy nói chuyện', 'nl': 'MIDAS: Een dialoog Act Annotatieschema voor open domein HumanMachine gesproken gesprekken', 'da': 'MIDAS: A Dialog Act Annotation Scheme for Open Domain HumanMachine Talken Conversations', 'hr': 'MIDAS: Šema oznake o zakonu o dijalogu za razgovore o otvorenom domenu ljudskim strojevima', 'bg': 'Схема за анотация на диалогов акт за разговори с отворен домейн, говорещи с човешка машина', 'id': 'MIDAS: Skema Annotasi Akte Dialog untuk Pembicaraan Pembukaan Domain HumanMachine', 'ko': 'MIDAS: 개방형 인터페이스 대화를 위한 대화 행위 주석 방안', 'fa': 'MIDAS: یک نقشه یادآوری قانون گفتگو برای گفتگو\u200cهای صحبت کردن ماشین انسانی دامنه باز', 'tr': 'MIDAS:A Dialog Act Annotation Scheme for Open Domain HumanMachine Spoken Conversations', 'sw': 'MIDAS: Mpango wa Kutangaza Sheria ya Dialog kwa ajili ya Mazungumzo ya Open Domain Humani', 'de': 'MIDAS: Ein Dialog Act Annotation Scheme für Open Domain HumanMachine Spoken Conversations', 'af': "'n Dialoog Wet Opmerking Skema vir Open Domain HumanMachine Spoken Gespraak", 'am': 'Machine Spoken Conversations', 'hy': 'MIDAS: Ակտի մեջ բաց բնագավառի մարդկային մեքենայի խոսակցությունների հայտարարման ծրագիր', 'bs': 'MIDAS: Šema oznake o zakonu o dijalogu za razgovore o otvorenom domenu ljudskim mašinama', 'sq': 'MIDAS: Një skemë njoftimi për Aktin e Dialogut për bisedimet e hapura të Domenit HumanMachine', 'ca': "MIDAS: Un esquema d'anotació de la Llei de Diàleg per converses parlades amb màquina humana en domini obert", 'az': 'MIDAS: A çıq Domain HumanMachine Spoken Konuşmaları üçün Dialog Act Annotation Scheme', 'cs': 'MIDAS: A Dialog Act Annotation Scheme for Open Domain HumanMachine Spoken Conversations', 'bn': 'মিডিয়াস: উন্মুক্ত ডোমেইন হিউম্যানমেশিনের কথোপকথনের জন্য একটি ডায়ালগ আইনের অ্যানোটেশন বিন্যাস বিন্যাস', 'et': 'MIDAS: Dialoogiakt Annotatsiooniskeem avatud domeeni inimmasinaga räägitavate vestluste jaoks', 'fi': 'MIDAS: Dialog Act Annotation Scheme for Open Domain HumanMachine Speaken Conversations', 'sk': 'MIDAS: Shema opombacij akta pogovornega okna za pogovore z odprto domeno Human Machine', 'jv': 'MDES: A Dialog Action Anntations scheme for Open domain Human Device Speakken conversations', 'he': 'MIDAS: מערכת ניתוח חוק דיאלוג עבור שיחות מדברים מדברים של משפחה אנושית פתוחה', 'bo': 'MIDAS: Dialog Act Annotation Scheme for Open Domain HumanMachine Spoken Conversations', 'ha': 'Machine Talks'}
{'en': 'Dialog act prediction in open-domain conversations is an essential language comprehension task for both dialog system building and discourse analysis. Previous dialog act schemes, such as SWBD-DAMSL, are designed mainly for discourse analysis in human-human conversations. In this paper, we present a dialog act annotation scheme, MIDAS (Machine Interaction Dialog Act Scheme), targeted at open-domain human-machine conversations. MIDAS is designed to assist machines to improve their ability to understand human partners. MIDAS has a hierarchical structure and supports multi-label annotations. We collected and annotated a large open-domain human-machine spoken conversation dataset (consisting of 24 K utterances). To validate our scheme, we leveraged transfer learning methods to train a multi-label dialog act prediction model and reached an F1 score of 0.79.', 'ar': 'يعد التنبؤ بأفعال الحوار في المحادثات المفتوحة مهمة فهم اللغة الأساسية لكل من بناء نظام الحوار وتحليل الخطاب. تم تصميم مخططات فعل الحوار السابقة ، مثل SWBD-DAMSL ، بشكل أساسي لتحليل الخطاب في المحادثات بين الإنسان والبشر. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم مخططًا توضيحيًا لفعل الحوار ، MIDAS (مخطط قانون حوار التفاعل الآلي) ، يستهدف المحادثات المفتوحة بين الإنسان والآلة. تم تصميم MIDAS لمساعدة الآلات على تحسين قدرتها على فهم الشركاء البشريين. تتمتع MIDAS بهيكل هرمي وتدعم التعليقات التوضيحية متعددة التسميات. قمنا بجمع مجموعة كبيرة من بيانات المحادثة المنطوقة بين الإنسان والآلة ومفتوحة المجال (تتكون من 24 ألف كلام). للتحقق من صحة مخططنا ، استفدنا من طرق تعلم التحويل لتدريب نموذج توقع إجراء حوار متعدد التسميات ووصلنا إلى درجة F1 تبلغ 0.79.', 'fr': "La prédiction des actes de dialogue dans les conversations ouvertes est une tâche de compréhension linguistique essentielle à la fois pour la construction d'un système de dialogue et pour l'analyse du discours. Les précédents modèles d'actes de dialogue, tels que SWBD-DAMSL, sont principalement conçus pour l'analyse du discours dans les conversations entre humains et humains. Dans cet article, nous présentons un schéma d'annotation d'acte de dialogue, MIDAS (Machine Interaction Dialog Act Scheme), destiné aux conversations homme-machine dans un domaine ouvert. MIDAS est conçu pour aider les machines à améliorer leur capacité à comprendre les partenaires humains. MIDAS possède une structure hiérarchique et prend en charge les annotations multi-étiquettes. Nous avons collecté et annoté un vaste ensemble de données de conversations orales homme-machine de domaine ouvert (composé de 24 000 énoncés). Pour valider notre schéma, nous avons utilisé des méthodes d'apprentissage par transfert pour entraîner un modèle de prédiction d'actes de dialogue multi-étiquettes et avons atteint un score F1 de 0,79.", 'pt': 'A previsão de atos de diálogo em conversas de domínio aberto é uma tarefa essencial de compreensão de linguagem tanto para a construção do sistema de diálogo quanto para a análise do discurso. Esquemas de atos de diálogo anteriores, como SWBD-DAMSL, são projetados principalmente para análise de discurso em conversas humano-humano. Neste artigo, apresentamos um esquema de anotação de ato de diálogo, MIDAS (Machine Interaction Dialog Act Scheme), voltado para conversas homem-máquina de domínio aberto. O MIDAS foi projetado para ajudar as máquinas a melhorar sua capacidade de entender os parceiros humanos. O MIDAS possui uma estrutura hierárquica e suporta anotações multi-rótulo. Coletamos e anotamos um grande conjunto de dados de conversação homem-máquina de domínio aberto (consistindo em 24 mil enunciados). Para validar nosso esquema, aproveitamos os métodos de aprendizado de transferência para treinar um modelo de previsão de atos de diálogo com vários rótulos e alcançamos uma pontuação F1 de 0,79.', 'es': 'La predicción del acto de diálogo en conversaciones de dominio abierto es una tarea esencial de comprensión del lenguaje tanto para la construcción de sistemas de diálogo como para el análisis del discurso. Los esquemas de actos de diálogo anteriores, como SWBD-DAMSL, están diseñados principalmente para el análisis del discurso en conversaciones entre humanos y humanos. En este artículo, presentamos un esquema de anotación de actos de diálogo, MIDAS (Machine Interaction Dialog Act Scheme), dirigido a conversaciones hombre-máquina de dominio abierto. MIDAS está diseñado para ayudar a las máquinas a mejorar su capacidad de entender a los socios humanos. MIDAS tiene una estructura jerárquica y admite anotaciones de múltiples etiquetas. Recopilamos y anotamos un gran conjunto de datos de conversación oral hombre-máquina de dominio abierto (que consiste en 24K enunciados). Para validar nuestro esquema, utilizamos métodos de aprendizaje por transferencia para entrenar un modelo de predicción de actos de diálogo de etiquetas múltiples y alcanzamos una puntuación F1 de 0,79.', 'zh': '开域对话中的对话行为对话系统构建和话话分析的大要。 前言行方,如SWBD-DAMSL,盖为人与人言析而设之也。 MIDAS(机器交),开域之人机对话。 MIDAS旨在助机器崇其解人伦。 MIDAS有层构,并多标注。 集注大开域人机口语数集(以 24K 语为)。 以验吾方,因迁徙而教之,得0.79之F1数。', 'ru': 'Прогнозирование диалоговых актов в разговорах с открытым доменом является важной задачей понимания языка как для построения диалоговой системы, так и для анализа дискурса. Предыдущие диалоговые схемы, такие как SWBD-DAMSL, предназначены в основном для анализа дискурса в разговорах между человеком и человеком. В этой статье мы представляем схему аннотации к диалоговому акту, MIDAS (Machine Interaction Dialog Act Scheme), предназначенную для разговоров между человеком и машиной в открытом доступе. МИДАС предназначен для того, чтобы помочь машинам улучшить их способность понимать человеческих партнеров. МИДАС имеет иерархическую структуру и поддерживает многоуровневые аннотации. Мы собрали и аннотировали большой открытый набор данных человеко-машинного разговора (состоящий из 24 тыс. высказываний). Чтобы проверить нашу схему, мы использовали методы обучения переносу для обучения модели предсказания многоуровневого диалогового акта и достигли показателя F1 0,79.', 'ja': 'オープンドメインの会話におけるダイアログアクト予測は、ダイアログシステム構築と対話分析の両方にとって不可欠な言語理解タスクです。SWBD - DAMSLなどの以前のダイアログアクトスキームは、主にヒトとヒトの会話における話題分析のために設計されている。本稿では、オープンドメインの人間と機械の会話を対象としたダイアログアクトアノテーションスキーム、MIDAS （ Machine Interaction Dialog Act Scheme ）を提示する。MIDASは、機械が人間のパートナーを理解する能力を向上させるのを支援するように設計されています。MIDASは階層構造を持ち、マルチラベル注釈をサポートしています。私たちは、大規模なオープンドメインのヒト-マシン話し言葉会話データセット（ 24 Kの発話からなる）を収集し、注釈を付けました。スキームを検証するために、マルチラベルダイアログアクト予測モデルをトレーニングするために転送学習方法を活用し、F 1スコアは0.79に達しました。', 'hi': 'ओपन-डोमेन वार्तालापों में संवाद अधिनियम भविष्यवाणी संवाद प्रणाली निर्माण और प्रवचन विश्लेषण दोनों के लिए एक आवश्यक भाषा समझ कार्य है। पिछली संवाद अधिनियम योजनाएं, जैसे SWBD-DAMSL, मुख्य रूप से मानव-मानव वार्तालापों में प्रवचन विश्लेषण के लिए डिज़ाइन की गई हैं। इस पेपर में, हम एक संवाद अधिनियम एनोटेशन योजना, MIDAS (मशीन इंटरैक्शन डायलॉग एक्ट स्कीम) प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जो ओपन-डोमेन मानव-मशीन वार्तालापों पर लक्षित है। MIDAS को मानव भागीदारों को समझने की उनकी क्षमता में सुधार करने के लिए मशीनों की सहायता करने के लिए डिज़ाइन किया गया है। MIDAS में एक पदानुक्रमित संरचना है और बहु-लेबल एनोटेशन का समर्थन करता है। हमने एक बड़े ओपन-डोमेन मानव-मशीन बोले जाने वाले वार्तालाप डेटासेट (24K कथनों से मिलकर) एकत्र और एनोटेट किया। हमारी योजना को मान्य करने के लिए, हमने एक बहु-लेबल संवाद अधिनियम भविष्यवाणी मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए स्थानांतरण सीखने के तरीकों का लाभ उठाया और 0.79 के एफ 1 स्कोर तक पहुंच गए।', 'ga': 'Tasc tuisceana teanga riachtanach is ea réamh-mheastachán gnímh idirphlé i gcomhráite fearainn oscailte chun córas dialóige a thógáil agus anailís dioscúrsa araon. Tá scéimeanna gnímh dialóige roimhe seo, mar SWBD-DAMSL, deartha go príomha le haghaidh anailíse dioscúrsa i gcomhráite daonna-daonna. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair scéim nótaí gnímh dialóige, MIDAS (Scéim um Acht Dialóige Idirghníomhaíochta Meaisín), atá dírithe ar chomhráite daonna-inneall oscailte. Tá MIDAS deartha chun cabhrú le meaisíní a gcumas comhpháirtithe daonna a thuiscint a fheabhsú. Tá struchtúr ordlathach ag MIDAS agus tacaíonn sé le nótaí illipéad. Bhailíomar agus rinneamar anótáil ar thacar sonraí comhrá cainte daonna mór-fhearainn oscailte (ar a raibh 24K cainte). Chun ár scéim a bhailíochtú, rinneamar modhanna foghlama aistrithe a ghiaráil chun múnla réamh-mheasta gníomh dialóige illipéid a oiliúint agus shroicheamar scór F1 de 0.79.', 'hu': 'A párbeszéd aktus előrejelzése nyílt domain beszélgetésekben elengedhetetlen nyelvértési feladat mind a párbeszédrendszer építéséhez, mind a diskurzuselemzéshez. A korábbi párbeszédcselekvési sémák, mint például az SWBD-DAMSL, elsősorban ember-ember beszélgetések diskurzuselemzésére szolgálnak. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatunk egy MIDAS (Machine Interaction Dialog Act Scheme) nevű párbeszédjegyzési sémát, amely nyílt tartományú ember-gép beszélgetésekre irányul. A MIDAS célja, hogy segítse a gépeket az emberi partnerek megértésére irányuló képességük javításában. A MIDAS hierarchikus struktúrával rendelkezik, és támogatja a többcímkés megjegyzéseket. Gyűjtöttünk és jegyzeteltünk egy nagyméretű, nyílt domain ember-gép beszélgetési adatkészletet (amely 24K kimondásokból áll). A rendszerünk érvényesítéséhez a transzfer tanulási módszereket használtuk egy többcímkés párbeszéd előrejelzési modellt képezve, és elértük az F1 pontszámot 0,79.', 'el': 'Η πρόβλεψη πράξεως διαλόγου σε συζητήσεις ανοικτού τομέα είναι μια βασική εργασία κατανόησης γλωσσών τόσο για την οικοδόμηση συστήματος διαλόγου όσο και για την ανάλυση λόγου. Προηγούμενα σχήματα πράξεων διαλόγου, όπως το SWBD-DAMSL, έχουν σχεδιαστεί κυρίως για ανάλυση λόγου σε συζητήσεις ανθρώπου-ανθρώπου. Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε ένα σχέδιο σχολιασμού πράξεως διαλόγου, με στόχο τις συζητήσεις ανθρώπου-μηχανής ανοικτού τομέα. Το έχει σχεδιαστεί για να βοηθήσει τις μηχανές να βελτιώσουν την ικανότητά τους να κατανοούν τους ανθρώπινους εταίρους. Το MIDAS έχει ιεραρχική δομή και υποστηρίζει σχόλια πολλαπλών ετικετών. Συλλέξαμε και σχολιάσαμε ένα μεγάλο σύνολο δεδομένων ομιλίας ανθρώπου-μηχανής ανοικτού χώρου (αποτελούμενο από ομιλίες 24Κ). Για να επικυρώσουμε το σχέδιό μας, αξιοποιήσαμε μεθόδους μάθησης μεταφοράς για να εκπαιδεύσουμε ένα μοντέλο πρόβλεψης πράξεων διαλόγου πολλαπλών ετικετών και φτάσαμε σε βαθμολογία F1 0,79.', 'it': "La previsione dell'atto di dialogo nelle conversazioni a dominio aperto è un compito essenziale di comprensione del linguaggio sia per la costruzione del sistema di dialogo che per l'analisi del discorso. Gli schemi di atti di dialogo precedenti, come SWBD-DAMSL, sono progettati principalmente per l'analisi del discorso nelle conversazioni uomo-uomo. In questo articolo, presentiamo uno schema di annotazione degli atti di dialogo, MIDAS (Machine Interaction Dialog Act Scheme), mirato alle conversazioni uomo-macchina a dominio aperto. MIDAS è progettato per aiutare le macchine a migliorare la loro capacità di comprendere i partner umani. MIDAS ha una struttura gerarchica e supporta annotazioni multi-etichetta. Abbiamo raccolto e annotato un ampio set di dati di conversazione vocale uomo-macchina a dominio aperto (composto da 24K dichiarazioni). Per convalidare il nostro schema, abbiamo sfruttato i metodi di apprendimento del trasferimento per formare un modello di previsione di atti di dialogo multi-etichetta e abbiamo raggiunto un punteggio F1 di 0,79.", 'kk': 'Диалогты ашық доменге айналысу үшін алдын- ала айналысу - диалог жүйесін құру мен дискурстарды анализ үшін негізгі тілді түсініктеме тапсырмасы. Алдыңғы диалог сұлбалары, мысалы SWBD- DAMSL, адамдар- адамдар сұлбаларында дискурстарды анализ үшін құрылады. Бұл қағазда MIDAS (Машин интерактивтік диалог жазбаларының сұлбасы) диалог белгілер сұлбасын көрсетедік. Ашылған доменге адамдар- машиналық сөйлесу үшін мақсатты. MIDAS адамдардың партнерін түсіну мүмкіндігін жақсарту үшін машиналарға көмектесу үшін құрылған. MIDAS иерархикалық құрылымы бар және көп жарлық жазбаларды қолдайды. Біз көп домен ашылған адамдардың сөйлесу деректер жинағын жинақтап, түсіндірдік (24K сөйлесімді). Біздің сұлбасымызды тексеру үшін көп белгілер диалогын бақылау үшін аудару әдістерін өзгертіп, F1 0,79 деңгейіне жеткіздік.', 'ka': 'დიალოგის აქტის წარმოდგენა დიალოგის გახსნა დიომინის განსახულებაში უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი ენის გაგრძელება დიალოგის სისტემის შექმნა და დიოკურის ანალიზაცი წინა დიალოგის ქემები, როგორც SWBD-DAMSL, უფრო განაზღვრებულია ადამიანის-ადამიანის საუბარებში დიალოგის ანალიზაციისთვის. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ აჩვენებთ დიალოგის აკტის ანოტაციის სქემი MIDAS (მაქსინური ინტერქექციის დიალოგის აკტის სქემი), რომელიც ადამიანური მაქსინური განსაუბრებაში MIDAS იყენებულია მაქანების დახმარებისთვის მაქანების შესაძლებლობას გაუფეთსოთ ადამიანის პონტერების შესაძლებლობა. MIDAS აქვს ჰიერაქტიკური სტრუქტურა და მრავალური ნიოტაციების დაეხმარება. ჩვენ შევქმნით და ამოტვირთეთ დიდი ადამიანის საუბრო მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია (24K სიტყვების შექმნა). ჩვენი სქემის გადაწყვეტილებისთვის, ჩვენ მოვიყენეთ გასწავლების მეტოვები, რომ გასწავლოთ მრავალური დიალოგის მოდელს დაწყვეტილების მოდელს და მივიღეთ F1 მოდელს 0,79.', 'mk': 'Dialog act prediction in open-domain conversations is an essential language comprehension task for both dialog system building and discourse analysis.  Претходните дијалошки активни шеми, како што е SWBD-DAMSL, се дизајнирани главно за дискурсна анализа во човек-човек разговори. Во овој документ, претставуваме шема на анотација на дијалогот, MIDAS (шема на дијалогот за интеракција на машините), насочена кон разговори со човек-машина на отворен домен. MIDAS is designed to assist machines to improve their ability to understand human partners.  MIDAS има хиерархиска структура и поддржува мултиетикетни анотации. Ги собравме и анотиравме големите податоци за разговор со човек-машина на отворен домен (кои се состојат од 24K изрази). За да ја потврдиме нашата шема, ги искористивме методите на трансферентно учење за да обучуваме модел за предвидување на дејствените дејства со мултиетички дијалози и постигнавме оценка F1 од 0,79.', 'ml': 'തുറന്ന ഡൊമൈന്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഡയലോഗിന്റെ പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് ഡയലോഗ് സംവിധാനത്തിന്റെ പണി മുമ്പുള്ള ഡയലോഗ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പദ്ധതികള്\u200d, SWBD-DAMSL പോലെ, മനുഷ്യരുടെ സംസാരത്തില്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിന് മുഖേ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ഡയലോഗ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. MIDAS (മെഷീന്\u200d ഇന്റര്\u200dച്ചെക്ഷന്\u200d ഡയലോഗ് പ്രക്രിമം),  മനുഷ്യരുടെ പങ്കാളികള്\u200dക്ക് മനസ്സിലാക്കാനുള്ള കഴിവ് മെച്ചനുകളെ സഹായിക്കാന്\u200d MIDAS നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പ MIDAS-ല്\u200d ഒരു ഹീരാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d ഘട്ടത്തിലുണ്ട് പല- ലേബിലെ അംഗീകരണങ്ങളെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നു. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു വലിയ തുറന്ന ഡൊമൈന്\u200d മനുഷ്യന്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് സെറ്റ് ചേര്\u200dത്ത് വ നമ്മുടെ പദ്ധതിയെ പരിശോധിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പല-ലേറ്റിലുള്ള ഡയലോഗ് പ്രവചന മോഡല്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d പു', 'mt': 'Il-previżjoni tal-att ta’ djalogu fil-konverżjonijiet f’dominju miftuħ hija kompitu essenzjali ta’ fehim lingwistiku kemm għall-bini tas-sistema ta’ djalogu kif ukoll għall-analiżi ta’ diskors. Previous dialog act schemes, such as SWBD-DAMSL, are designed mainly for discourse analysis in human-human conversations.  F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw skema ta’ annotazzjoni ta’ att ta’ djalogu, MIDAS (Machine Interaction Act Scheme), immirata lejn konverżjonijiet ta’ dominju miftuħ bejn il-bniedem u l-magna. MIDAS huwa mfassal biex jgħin lill-magni biex itejbu l-ħila tagħhom li jifhmu l-imsieħba umani. MIDAS għandu struttura ġerarkika u jappoġġja annotazzjonijiet b’ħafna tikketti. Inġabru u nnotaw sett kbir ta’ dejta ta’ konversazzjoni miftuħa bejn il-bniedem u l-magna (li jikkonsisti f’dikjarazzjonijiet ta’ 24K). Biex tivvalida l-iskema tagħna, a ħna naħdmu metodi ta’ tagħlim ta’ trasferiment biex inħarrġu mudell ta’ tbassir ta’ att ta’ djalogu b’diversi tikketti u laħqu punteġġ F1 ta’ 0.79.', 'lt': 'Dialogo veiksmų prognozė atviro domeno pokalbiuose yra esminis kalbos supratimo uždavinys tiek dialogo sistemos kūrimui, tiek diskurso analizei. Previous dialog act schemes, such as SWBD-DAMSL, are designed mainly for discourse analysis in human-human conversations.  In this paper, we present a dialog act annotation scheme, MIDAS (Machine Interaction Dialog Act Scheme), targeted at open-domain human-machine conversations.  MIDAS skirtas padedant mašinoms geriau suprasti žmogaus partnerius. MIDAS turi hierarchinę struktūrą ir remia įvairių ženklų anotacijas. Mes surinkėme ir užrašėme didelį atviro domeno žmogaus ir mašinos kalbėtų pokalbių duomenų rinkinį (kurį sudaro 24K žodžiai). Norėdami patvirtinti mūsų sistemą, mes naudojome perkėlimo mokymosi metodus, kad parengtume daugiakalbį dialogo akto prognozavimo model į ir pasiekėme F1 rezultatą 0,79.', 'mn': 'Диалог үйл ажиллагаа нээлттэй холбоотой ярилцлагуудын таамаглалт нь диалог системийн бүтээмж болон ярилцлагын шинжилгээ хоёуланг нь чухал хэл ойлгох үйл ажиллагаа юм. СWBD-DAMSL гэх мэт өмнөх диалогын үйл ажиллагааны схемүүд нь ихэвчлэн хүний-хүний ярилцлаганд ярилцлага шинжилгээнд зохион байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид Диалог-ын анзаарлын төлөвлөгөө, MIDAS (Machine Interaction Dialog Act Scheme), нээлттэй холбоотой хүн-машин ярилцлаганд зориулсан. MIDAS нь хүний хамтрагчдыг ойлгох чадварыг сайжруулахын тулд машинуудыг туслах зорилготой. MIDAS-д олон жагсаалтыг дэмжиж байна. Бид хүн төрөлхтний машины ярианы өгөгдлийн санг цуглуулж, анзаарсан. Бид олон загварын диалог загварын хөгжүүлэх загварын тулд шилжүүлэх арга загварыг ашиглаж F1 0.79 тоо хүртсэн.', 'pl': 'Przewidywanie aktów dialogowych w rozmowach otwartych jest istotnym zadaniem rozumienia języka zarówno dla budowania systemu dialogowego, jak i analizy dyskursu. Poprzednie schematy dialogowe, takie jak SWBD-DAMSL, są przeznaczone głównie do analizy dyskursu w rozmowach człowiek-człowiek. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy schemat adnotacji aktów dialogowych, MIDAS (Machine Interaction Dialog Act Scheme), skierowany do rozmów człowiek-maszyna w otwartej domenie. MIDAS został zaprojektowany, aby wspomagać maszyny w poprawie ich zdolności do zrozumienia ludzkich partnerów. MIDAS ma hierarchiczną strukturę i obsługuje adnotacje wieloznakowe. Zebraliśmy i adnotatowaliśmy duży, otwarty zestaw danych rozmowy człowiek-maszyna (składający się z 24K wypowiedzi). Aby zweryfikować nasz schemat, wykorzystaliśmy metody uczenia się transferowego do treningu wieloznakowego modelu prognozowania aktów dialogowych i osiągnęliśmy wynik F1 0,79.', 'no': 'Dialogvindauget gjer forhåndsvising i open-domain-samtaler er ein viktig språk for både dialogbygging og diskursanalyser. Førre dialogoppsett for handling av skjemar, som SWBD-DAMSL, er utforma hovudsakelig for diskursanalyse i menneske-menneske samtaler. I denne papiret viser vi eit dialogoppmerksomsett for annotasjonar, MIDAS (maskineInteraksjonsdialog Act Scheme) med mål på samtaler med menneskemaskinen med opna domene. MIDAS er designert for å hjelpa maskiner for å forbedra sine kapasitet til å forstå menneskelige partnerar. MIDAS har ein hierarkisk struktur og støttar fleire merkelappar. Vi samla og oppmerka ein stor datasett for samtale med menneskemaskinen med open-domain (som inneheld 24K uttaler). For å validera skjemaet vårt, har vi levert overføringsmetoder for å trenga eit multimerkelapp dialogvindauge for å gjera forhåndsvisingsmodul og nådd ein F1- poeng med 0,79.', 'ms': 'Ramalan tindakan dialog dalam perbualan domain terbuka adalah tugas pemahaman bahasa penting untuk membina sistem dialog dan analisis diskursus. Skema tindakan dialog terdahulu, seperti SWBD-DAMSL, dirancang terutamanya untuk analisis diskors dalam perbualan manusia-manusia. Dalam kertas ini, kami perkenalkan skema anotasi tindakan dialog, MIDAS (Skema Akta Dialog Interaksi Mesin), yang ditujukan pada perbualan manusia-mesin domain terbuka. MIDAS direka untuk membantu mesin untuk memperbaiki kemampuan mereka untuk memahami rakan-rakan manusia. MIDAS mempunyai struktur hierarkis dan menyokong anotasi multi-label. Kami mengumpulkan dan anotasi set data perbualan manusia-mesin domain terbuka yang besar (terdiri dari ungkapan 24K). Untuk sahkan skema kami, kami menggunakan kaedah pembelajaran pemindahan untuk melatih model ramalan tindakan dialog berbilang label dan mencapai skor F1 0.79.', 'ro': 'Predicția actului de dialog în conversațiile cu domeniu deschis este o sarcină esențială de înțelegere a limbii atât pentru construirea sistemului de dialog, cât și pentru analiza discursului. Schemele anterioare de acte de dialog, cum ar fi SWBD-DAMSL, sunt concepute în principal pentru analiza discursului în conversațiile om-om. În această lucrare, prezentăm o schemă de adnotare a actelor de dialog, MIDAS (Machine Interaction Dialog Act Scheme), destinată conversațiilor cu domeniu deschis om-mașină. MIDAS este conceput pentru a ajuta utilajele să își îmbunătățească capacitatea de a înțelege partenerii umani. MIDAS are o structură ierarhică și suportă adnotări multi-etichete. Am colectat și adnotat un set larg de date de conversație vorbită om-mașină cu domeniu deschis (format din 24K de pronunțări). Pentru a valida schema noastră, am folosit metodele de învățare de transfer pentru a instrui un model de predicție a actelor de dialog multi-etichete și am atins un scor F1 de 0,79.', 'sr': 'Predviđanje dijaloga u razgovorima o otvorenom domenu je ključni zadatak razumijevanja jezika za izgradnju dijalogskih sistema i analizu diskursa. Преди диалогове схеме действања, например SWBD-DAMSL, су проектирани главно за анализу дискурса у људским и људским разговорима. U ovom papiru predstavljamo šemu annotacije za dijalog, MIDAS (Šema zakona o mašinskom interakcijskom dijalogu), ciljanu na razgovore o ljudskim mašinama otvorenom domenu. MIDAS je dizajniran da pomogne mašinama da poboljšaju sposobnost razumevanja ljudskih partnera. MIDAS ima hijerarhičku strukturu i podržava višeetičke annotacije. Skupljali smo i annotirali veliku otvorenu domenu podatke o razgovoru sa ljudskim mašinama (sastavljajući od 24K reči). Da bismo potvrdili našu šemu, iskoristili smo metode prijenosnog učenja kako bi obučili model predviđanja multietičkog dijaloga i ostvarili rezultat F1 od 0,79.', 'si': 'සංවාද ප්\u200dරවේශ පද්ධති නිර්මාණය සහ විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා සංවාද පද්ධති නිර්මාණය සඳහා සංවාද විශ්ලේෂණය ස මුලින් සංවාදය සම්බන්ධ විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා SWBD-DAMSL වගේ, මිනිස්සු සම්බන්ධ වාර්තාවයේ කතාවක් විශ්ලේෂ මේ පැත්තේ, අපි සංවාදයක් පෙන්වන්නම්, MIDAS (මැෂින් සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සංවාදය සම්බන්ධ සංවාදය ස්කීම්), විවෘ MIDAS නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ මිනිස්සු සහයෝගිකයෝ තේරුම් ගන්න උදව් කරන්න. MIDAS එක්ක අභ්\u200dයාගයක් තියෙනවා සහ ගොඩක් ලේබල් කිරීම් සහය සඳහායි. අපි ලොකු විශාල ප්\u200dරවේශයක් සම්බන්ධ කරලා තියෙන්නේ මිනිස්සු මැෂින් කතා කතා කරපු දත්ත සැට (24K කතා කර අපේ පරීක්ෂණය විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි ගොඩක් ලේබල් සංවාදයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා F1 ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් 0.', 'so': 'Waxyaabaha ku qoran qoraalka ku saabsan hadalka furan waa shaqada aasaasiga ah ee ku qoran dhismaha nidaamka bulshada iyo baaritaanka hadalka. Qorshaha falka ee hore, tusaale ahaan SWBD-DAMSL, waxaa loo qoray si ugu badan baaritaanka hadalka dadka. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku qornaa qorshaha qalabka dhibaatada, MIDAS (Scheme Sharciga Dagaalka Interaction Machine Interaction), kaas oo loogu talo galay talooyin furan-domain human-machine. MIDAS waxaa loogu talagalay in lagu caawiyo mashiinadaha si ay u hagaajiyaan awoodooda ay u fahamaan lammaanaha dadka. MIDAS wuxuu leeyahay hierarchical structure, wuxuuna taageeraa annotations in badan. Waxaannu soo urursannay oo dhibaataysanay qoraal macluumaad la hadlo oo afka dadka oo furan (waxaa ka mid ah 24K hadal). Si a an u xaqiijinno qorshaheenna, waxaynu u dhiibannay qaababka waxbarashada, si aan u tababarinno model wax u sii sheegidda oo kala duduwan, waxaana gaadhnay koox F1 oo 0.79 ah.', 'sv': 'Dialogakt förutsägelse i konversationer med öppen domän är en viktig språkförståelse för både dialogsystembyggande och diskursanalys. Tidigare dialoghandlingsscheman, såsom SWBD-DAMSL, är främst utformade för diskursanalys i människa-människa samtal. I den här uppsatsen presenterar vi ett kommentarschema för dialogakter, MIDAS (Machine Interaction Dialog Act Scheme), riktat mot öppna domänkonversationer mellan människa och maskin. MIDAS är utformad för att hjälpa maskiner att förbättra deras förmåga att förstå mänskliga partners. MIDAS har en hierarkisk struktur och stöder multi-label anteckningar. Vi samlade in och kommenterade en stor öppen domän människa-maskin talad konversationsdata (bestående av 24K yttranden). För att validera vårt schema utnyttjade vi överföringsinlärningsmetoder för att träna en multi-label dialog act prediction modell och nådde en F1 poäng på 0,79.', 'ur': 'کھولتا ہوا ڈومین کی باتوں میں ڈالیلوگ کا اظہار کرنا ایک ضروری زبان کی سمجھ کا کام ہے دونوں ڈالیلوگ سیسٹم بنیاد اور بحث تحلیل کے لئے۔ اگلے ڈالیلوگ کے مطابق ایسے مطابق SWBD-DAMSL کے مطابق انسان-انسان کی باتوں میں صحبت کی تحلیل کے لئے طراحی کی جاتی ہیں. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک ڈالیٹ اکٹ انٹوریٹ سکیم پیش کرتے ہیں، MIDAS (ماشین انٹراکس ڈالیٹ ڈالیٹ اکٹر کیٹ کیٹ سکیم) جو کھلے ڈومین انسان-ماشین کی باتوں پر موجود ہے۔ MIDAS نے ماشین کی مدد کرنے کے لئے طراحی کی ہے کہ انسان کے شریکوں کو سمجھ سکیں MIDAS کے پاس ایک ہیرارک ساختار ہے اور بہت سی لیبل نوٹیزوں کی مدد کرتا ہے. ہم نے ایک بڑی کھلی دامنی انسان-ماشین کی صحبت کی ڈیٹ سٹ کو جمع کر لیا اور آواز دی۔ ہماری طرح کی تصویر کی validation کے لئے، ہم نے ایک متعدد لیبل ڈالیلوگ کی ترینس کے مطابق ترینس سیکھنے کی طرح استعمال کی اور 0.79 کی F1 اسکور تک پہنچ گئی۔', 'ta': 'திறந்த டோமைன் பேச்சில் உரையாடல் செயல் முன்னோட்டம் என்பது உரையாடல் அமைப்பு உரையாடல் அமைப்பு மற்றும் பேச்சு ஆராய்ச்சிக முந்தைய உரையாடல் செயல் திட்டங்கள், SWBD-DAMSL போன்ற, மனித உரையாடல் பேச்சை ஆராய்வு முக்கியமாக வடிவமைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு உரையாடல் செயல் அறிவிப்பு திட்டத்தை காண்பிக்கிறோம், MIDAS (Machine Interaction Dialog Act Scheme), திறந்த டோமைன் மனித இயந்திரத்தின MIDAS வடிவமைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மனித கூட்டாளிகளை புரிந்து கொள்ள இயந்திரங்களுக்கு உதவும். MIDAS கிடைக்கும் மையமான கட்டமைப்பு மற்றும் பல- விளக்கச்சீட்டு அறிவிப்புகளை ஆதரிக்கிறது. நாங்கள் ஒரு பெரிய திறந்த டோமைன் மனிதன் பேசும் இயந்திரம் பேசும் தகவல் அமைப்பை சேகரித்துக் கொண்டுள்ளோம் மற்றும் த எங்கள் திட்டத்தை சரிபார்க்க, பல உரையாடல் பெட்டியின் முறைமையை பயிற்சி செய்ய முறைமைகளை நாங்கள் அனுப்பி முறைமைகளை அனுப்பி மற்றும்', 'uz': "Name @ info Bu qogʻozda, biz muloqat amalning taʼminlovchi qolipini MIDAS (mashina interaction Dialog Act Scheme) ochiq inson-machine muloqatlariga ega qilamiz. MIDAS asboblarni inson bilan bog'liqlarini o'rganish qobiliyatini oshirish uchun mashinalarga yordam beradi. Name Biz juda ko'p ochiq domen- inson mashinasi bilan gapiradigan muloqat maʼlumotlar tarkibini olib keldik (24K gapiradigan so'zlar bilan). Qoidamizni to ʻgʻrilash uchun biz multi-yorliq muloqat muloqat muloqat muloqat muloqat oynasini taʼminlashga o'rganish usullarini yordam berdik va oldinga 0.79 darajaga F1 qismiga keldik.", 'vi': 'Lời tiên đoán hành động hộp thoại trong các cuộc đối thoại mở miền là một nhiệm vụ thấu hiểu ngôn ngữ cần thiết cho cả việc xây dựng hệ thống hộp thoại lẫn phân tích. Những hoạt động thoại trước, như SWBD-DAMSL, được thiết kế chủ yếu cho phân tích ngôn ngữ trong các cuộc nói chuyện. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu một chương trình ghi chú hành động thoại, MIDAS (Machine tương tác Dialogo Act Scheme), nhắm vào các cuộc trò chuyện người-máy miền mở. MIDAS được thiết kế để hỗ trợ máy móc để nâng cao khả năng hiểu biết đối tác con người. MIDAS có một cấu trúc thứ tự và hỗ trợ ghi chú đa nhãn. Chúng tôi đã thu thập và ghi chú lưu trữ dữ liệu đối thoại với máy nói chuyện rộng mở. Để xác định kế hoạch của chúng tôi, chúng tôi đã dùng phương pháp truyền tải để đào tạo một mô hình dự đoán hành động đa nhãn và đạt điểm số F1 của 0.89.', 'da': 'Forudsigelse af dialoghandlinger i åbent domæne samtaler er en vigtig sprogforståelsesopgave for både dialog system opbygning og diskursanalyse. Tidligere dialoghandlinger, såsom SWBD-DAMSL, er primært designet til diskursanalyse i menneske-menneske samtaler. I denne artikel præsenterer vi en dialog act annotation scheme, MIDAS (Machine Interaction Dialog Act Scheme), målrettet mod åbne domæner menneske-maskine samtaler. MIDAS er designet til at hjælpe maskiner med at forbedre deres evne til at forstå menneskelige partnere. MIDAS har en hierarkisk struktur og understøtter multi-label annotationer. Vi indsamlede og kommenterede et stort open-domain menneske-maskine talesamtaledatasæt (bestående af 24K udtalelser). For at validere vores plan udnyttede vi overførsel læringsmetoder til at træne en multi-label dialog act prognose model og nåede en F1 score på 0,79.', 'de': 'Die Vorhersage von Dialogakten in Open-Domain-Gesprﾃ､chen ist eine wesentliche Sprachverstﾃ､ndnisaufgabe sowohl fﾃｼr den Aufbau von Dialogsystemen als auch fﾃｼr die Diskursanalyse. Bisherige Dialogaktenschemata, wie SWBD-DAMSL, sind hauptsﾃ､chlich fﾃｼr die Diskursanalyse in Mensch-Mensch-Gesprﾃ､chen konzipiert. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir ein Annotationsschema fﾃｼr Dialoge vor, MIDAS (Machine Interaction Dialog Act Scheme), das auf offene Mensch-Maschine-Gesprﾃ､che abzielt. MIDAS wurde entwickelt, um Maschinen dabei zu unterstﾃｼtzen, ihre Fﾃ､higkeit zu verbessern, menschliche Partner zu verstehen. MIDAS hat eine hierarchische Struktur und unterstﾃｼtzt Multi-Label-Anmerkungen. Wir sammelten und kommentierten einen groﾃ歹n Open-Domain Mensch-Maschine gesprochenen Konversationsdatensatz (bestehend aus 24K ﾃеﾃ歹rungen). Um unser Schema zu validieren, nutzten wir Transfer-Lernmethoden, um ein Multi-Label Dialogact Vorhersagemodell zu trainieren und erreichten einen F1 Score von 0,79.', 'bg': 'Прогнозирането на диалоговия акт в разговорите с отворен домейн е основна задача за разбиране на езика както за изграждане на диалогова система, така и за анализ на дискурса. Предишните диалогови схеми, като например SWBD-DAMSL, са предназначени главно за дискурсен анализ в разговори между човек и човек. В настоящата статия представяме схема за анотация на диалогов акт, насочена към разговори човек-машина с отворен домейн. МИДАС е проектиран да подпомага машините да подобрят способността си да разбират човешките партньори. MIDAS има йерархична структура и поддържа многоетикетни анотации. Събрахме и анотирахме голям отворен домейн разговорен набор от данни за човек-машина (състоящ се от 24К изказвания). За да валидираме нашата схема, използвахме методите за трансферно обучение, за да обучим модел за прогнозиране на диалоговия акт с множество етикети и достигнахме оценка от 0,79.', 'nl': "Dialoogactvoorspelling in open-domein gesprekken is een essentiële taak voor taalbegrip voor zowel dialoogsysteemopbouw als discoursanalyse. Eerdere dialogactschema's, zoals SWBD-DAMSL, zijn voornamelijk ontworpen voor discoursanalyse in mens-mens gesprekken. In dit artikel presenteren we een annotatieschema voor dialooghandelingen, MIDAS (Machine Interaction Dialog Act Scheme), gericht op open-domein mens-machine gesprekken. MIDAS is ontworpen om machines te helpen hun vermogen om menselijke partners te begrijpen te verbeteren. MIDAS heeft een hiërarchische structuur en ondersteunt multi-label annotaties. We verzamelden en annotateerden een grote open-domein mens-machine gesproken conversatie dataset (bestaande uit 24K uitingen). Om ons schema te valideren, gebruikten we transferleermethoden om een multi-label dialog act voorspellingsmodel te trainen en bereikten we een F1 score van 0,79.", 'hr': 'Predvidba djela o dijalogu u razgovorima o otvorenom domenu je ključni zadatak razumijevanja jezika za izgradnju dijalogskih sustava i analizu diskursa. Prethodni programi djelovanja dijaloga, poput SWBD-DAMSL, su dizajnirani uglavnom za analizu diskursa u razgovorima o ljudima i ljudima. U ovom papiru predstavljamo šemu annotacije djelovanja dijaloga, MIDAS (Šema Zakona o zakonu o interakcijskom dijalogu za strojeve), ciljanu na razgovore o ljudskim strojevima otvorenom domenu. MIDAS je dizajniran za pomoć strojevima da poboljšaju sposobnost razumijevanja ljudskih partnera. MIDAS ima hijerarhičku strukturu i podržava višeetičke annotacije. Skupljali smo i annotirali veliku otvorenu domenu podatke o razgovoru s ljudskim strojevima (sastavljajući od 24K riječi). Da bismo potvrdili našu šemu, upotrijebili smo metode učenja prijenosa kako bi obučili model predviđanja multietičkog dijaloga i ostvarili rezultat F1 od 0,79.', 'id': 'Prediksi tindakan dialog dalam konversasi domain terbuka adalah tugas pemahaman bahasa penting untuk membangun sistem dialog dan analisis diskors. Skema tindakan dialog sebelumnya, seperti SWBD-DAMSL, dirancang terutama untuk analisis diskors dalam percakapan manusia-manusia. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan skema annotasi tindakan dialog, MIDAS (Machine Interaction Dialog Act Scheme), yang ditujukan pada percakapan manusia-mesin domain terbuka. MIDAS dirancang untuk membantu mesin untuk memperbaiki kemampuan mereka untuk memahami mitra manusia. MIDAS memiliki struktur hierarkis dan mendukung anotasi multi-label. Kami mengumpulkan dan menyatakan sebuah set data pembicaraan manusia-mesin domain terbuka besar (yang terdiri dari 24.000 ucapan). To validate our scheme, we leveraged transfer learning methods to train a multi-label dialog act prediction model and reached an F1 score of 0.79.', 'sw': 'Utabiti wa kitendo cha Dialog katika mazungumzo ya wazi ya ndani ni kazi muhimu ya ujumla wa lugha kwa ajili ya ujenzi wa mfumo wa mazungumzo na uchambuzi wa mazungumzo. Mpango wa kitendo cha mazungumzo yaliyopita, kama vile SWBD-DAMSL, umeundwa kwa ajili ya uchambuzi wa mazungumzo katika mazungumzo ya binadamu. Katika karatasi hii, tunaleta mpango wa kitendo cha uchunguzi wa mazungumzo, MIDAS (Mpango wa Sheria ya Dialogu ya Kimashine ya Mitandao), unalengwa na mazungumzo ya mashine ya wazi ya binadamu. MIDAS imelengwa kusaidia mashine ili kuboresha uwezo wao wa kuelewa na washirika wa binadamu. MIDAS ina muundo wa mipango na unaunga mkono matangazo ya mitandao mbalimbali. Tumekusanya na tukadhihirisha mashine makubwa ya mazungumzo ya binadamu yenye uwazi (ikiwa ni pamoja na hotuba 24K). To validate our scheme, we leveraged transfer learning methods to train a multi-label dialog act prediction model and reached an F1 score of 0.79.', 'fa': 'پیش\u200cبینی حرکت دیalog در گفتگوهای دامنه باز یک کار اصلی برای ساختن سیستم محاوره و تحلیل گفتگو است. نقشه\u200cهای محاورۀ قبلی، مثل SWBD-DAMSL، برای تحلیل سخنرانی در گفتگوهای انسان و انسان طراحی می\u200cشوند. در این کاغذ، ما یک برنامه اظهار اعلام کردن محاورۀ محاورۀ محاورۀ محاورۀ محاورۀ محاورۀ MIDAS (نقشهٔ قانون مشترک مشترک ماشین) را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، که در گفتگوهای ماشین\u200c MIDAS طراحی شده تا دستگاه\u200cها را کمک کند تا توانایی\u200cهایشان را به درک شریکان انسان بهبود کند. MIDAS یک ساختار معماری دارد و نشانه\u200cهای چند برچسب را پشتیبانی می\u200cکند. ما یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای صحبت با ماشین انسان\u200cهای باز\u200cشده\u200cای را جمع کرده\u200cایم و نشان داده\u200cایم (از کلمات 24K). برای تایید کردن برنامه\u200cهای ما، ما روش\u200cهای یادگیری انتقال را برای آموزش یک مدل پیش\u200cبینی با برنامه\u200cهای متعدد و برنامه\u200cهای F1 از 0.79 تحت تایید قرار دادیم.', 'ko': '개방역 대화에서의 대화 행위 예측은 대화 시스템 구축과 문장 분석에서 없어서는 안 될 언어 이해 임무이다.이전의 대화 행위 모델, 예를 들어 SWBD-DAMSL은 주로 인류 대화에서의 말 분석을 위해 설계된 것이다.본고는 개방된 지역 인간 대화를 위한 대화 행위 표시 방안인 MIDAS(Machine Interaction dialog act scheme)를 제시했다.MIDAS는 기계가 인간 파트너를 이해하는 능력을 향상시키는 데 도움을 주는 데 목적을 두고 있다.MIDAS에는 다중 태그 주석을 지원하는 계층 구조가 있습니다.우리는 24K개의 문구로 구성된 대형 개방역 인간 대화 데이터 집합을 수집하고 주석했다.우리의 방안을 검증하기 위해 우리는 이동 학습 방법을 이용하여 다중 라벨 대화 행위 예측 모델을 훈련했는데 F1은 0.79로 나타났다.', 'tr': "Aç-domani soňlaýyşlarda Dialog öňünden geçirmek hem dijal sistemi gurama hem diskler analizi üçin esasy bir dil düşünmesidir. SWBD-DAMSL ýaly öňki dialogyň çykyşlary adam-ynsan gürrüňinde gürrüňler analysi üçin tasarlanýar. Bu kagyzda MIDAS (Makine Interaction Dialog Act'yň Taýýarlama Maglumaty), a çyk-domaýdan insan-maşynyň gürrüňlerde maksady berilýäris. MIDAS ynsan ortaklaryny düşünmek üçin maşynlara kömek etmek üçin tasarlanýar. MIDAS bir iýerarhiýa strukturasy bar we köp etiket töwürmelerini destekleýär. Biz büyük a çyk-domaýdan adam bilen gürleşýän resmi verileri topladyk we ýazyldyk (24K sözleriň diýipdir). Taýýarlarymyzy barlamak üçin, bir çoklu etiket dialogyny öwrenmek üçin önümleme nusgasyny ulandyk we 0,79 derejesine ýetdik.", 'sq': 'Parashikimi i veprimeve të dialogut në bisedimet me domini të hapur është një detyrë thelbësore për kuptimin e gjuhës si për ndërtimin e sistemit të dialogut ashtu edhe për analizën e diskursit. Skema të veprimit të dialogut të mëparshëm, të tilla si SWBD-DAMSL, janë projektuar kryesisht për analizën e diskursit në bisedimet njerëzor-njerëzor. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një skemë të anotacionit të veprimeve të dialogut, MIDAS (skema e veprimeve të dialogut të ndërveprimeve të makinave), me qëllim bisedimet në domeni të hapur njeri-makinë. MIDAS është projektuar për të ndihmuar makinat për të përmirësuar aftësinë e tyre për të kuptuar partnerët njerëzorë. MIDAS ka një strukturë hierarkike dhe mbështet anotacione me shumë etiketa. Ne mbledhëm dhe anotuam një grup të dhënash të bisedimeve të hapura me makinë-njerëz të biseduara (që përbëhet nga 24K shprehje). To validate our scheme, we leveraged transfer learning methods to train a multi-label dialog act prediction model and reached an F1 score of 0.79.', 'af': "Dialoog bewerk voorskou in open-domain omskakelinge is 'n nuwe taal verstaan taak vir beide dialoog stelsel bou en diskurse analisie. Vorige dialoog werk skeme, soos SWBD-DAMSL, is ontwerp hoofsaaklik vir diskursanaliseer in mens-menslike gesprekke. In hierdie papier, ons voorsien 'n dialoog aktief annotasie skema, MIDAS (Masjien Interaksie Dialoog Wet Skema), gemaak op open-domein mens-masjien-gesprekke. MIDAS is ontwerp om masjiene te help om hul kapasiteit te verbeter om menslike partnere te verstaan. Midas het 'n hierarkies struktuur en ondersteun multi- label notasies. Ons het 'n groot open-domein mens-masjien gespreek gesprekslys datastel versamel en opgemerk (bestaan van 24K uitspraak). Om ons skema te geldigheid, het ons die oordragmetode van onderwerp gebruik om 'n multietiket dialoog te trein voorskou model en 'n F1 telling van 0.79 bereik.", 'am': 'dialog Previous dialog act schemes, such as SWBD-DAMSL, are designed mainly for discourse analysis in human-human conversations.  በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ አቀማመጥ አቀማመጥ ፕሮግራም፣ MIDAS (Machine Interaction Dialog Act Scheme) በተከፈተ ድምፅ የሰው-machine ንግግር የተመሳሳይ ነው፡፡ MIDAS መሣሪያዎች የሰው ባልንጀሮቻቸውን ለማስተዋል ማድረግ ለመረዳት ነው፡፡ የMIDAS መሠረት መሠረት አለበት እና በብዙ-label annotations ይደግጋል። በ24K ንግግር የተናገረውን የድምፅ አካባቢ ዳታዎችን ሰብሰብን እና አሰቃየን፡፡ የፕሮግራማችንን ለማስተካክል፣ ብዙ-label የጥያቄ ጥያቄን ለመፍጠር እና የአፍሪካ ነጥብ 0.79 ደረስን፡፡', 'bn': 'খোলা ডোমেইন আলোচনায় ডায়ালগ কাজের ভবিষ্যৎবাণী হচ্ছে ডায়ালগ সিস্টেম বিল্ডিং এবং কথোপকথন বিশ্লেষণের জন্য একটি গুরুত্বপূ পূর্ববর্তী ডায়ালগের কাজের বিন্যাস, যেমন SWBD-DAMSL, মানুষের আলোচনায় কথোপকথন বিশ্লেষণের জন্য তৈরি করা হয়েছে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি ডায়ালগ কার্যক্রমের বিশ্লেষণ পরিকল্পনা উপস্থাপন করছি, MIDAS (মেশিন ইন্টারনেটার্কেশন ডায়ালগ আইন বিন্যাস) যার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে উন্ম মিডিয়াসের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে মেশিনের সাহায্য করার জন্য মানুষের সঙ্গীদের বোঝার ক্ষমতা উন্নত করার জন্য। MIDAS এর একটি হায়েরার্কিক কাঠামো আছে এবং বহুলেবেলের বিষয়বস্তু সমর্থন করে। আমরা একটি বিশাল উন্মুক্ত ডোমেইন মানব-মেশিনের কথোপকথন ডাটাসেট সংগ্রহ করেছি এবং বিরক্ত করেছি (২৪,০০০ ভাষায় আছে)। আমাদের পরিকল্পনা বৈধ করার জন্য, আমরা বহুল লেবেলের ডায়ালগ প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য ট্রান্সফার্নার শিক্ষার পদ্ধতি প্রদান করেছি এবং একটি ফাইলের প্রতি', 'ca': "La predicció d'actes de diàleg en converses de domini obert és una tasca essencial de comprensió del llenguatge tant per a la construcció del sistema de diàleg com per a l'an àlisi del discurs. Els esquemes de diàleg anteriors, com SWBD-DAMSL, estan dissenyats principalment per a l'anàlisi del discurs en converses humanes. En aquest article presentem un esquema d'anotació d'actes de diàleg, MIDAS (Esquema d'actes de diàleg d'interacció de màquines), destinat a converses de domini obert entre humans i màquines. MIDAS està dissenyat per ajudar màquines a millorar la seva habilitat d'entendre parelles humanes. MIDAS té una estructura jeràrquica i suporta anotacions multietiquetades. Vam recollir i anotar un gran conjunt de dades de conversació parlada amb màquina human a de domini obert (compost de 24K expressions). Per validar el nostre esquema, vam utilitzar mètodes d'aprenentatge de transfer ència per formar un model de predicció d'actes multietiquetats de diàleg i vam aconseguir una puntuació F1 de 0,79.", 'hy': 'Բաց բնագավառի հաղորդակցությունների ժամանակ պատկերացումը լեզվի հասկացության կարևոր խնդիր է, և համակարգի ստեղծման համար, և քննարկումների վերլուծության համար: Անցյալ խոսակցության գործողությունների ծրագրերը, ինչպիսիք են SW BD-DAMSL, հիմնականում նախագծված են մարդկային-մարդկային հաղորդակցությունների խոսակցության վերլուծության համար: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի բացատրական գործողության annoտացիոն սխեմա, MIDAS (Մեքենային ինտերակցիոն գործողության բացատրական գործողության ծրագիր), որը նշանակում է մարդկային-մեքենային բացատրական հաղորդակցություններ: MIDAS-ը նախագծված է օգնելու մեքենաներին բարելավել մարդկային գործընկերների հասկանալու ունակությունը: MIDAS has a hierarchical structure and supports multi-label annotations.  Մենք հավաքեցինք և նկարագրեցինք մարդկային-մեքենային խոսակցության մեծ բաց բնագավառի տվյալներ (որոնք կազմված են 24K արտահայտություններից): Մեր ծրագիրը հաստատելու համար մենք օգտագործեցինք փոխանցման ուսումնասիրության մեթոդները, որպեսզի պատրաստենք բազմաթիվ պատկերացումների գործողության կանխատեսման մոդել և հասանք F1-ի 0,79 գնահատման:', 'az': 'Açıq-domani danışışmalarında Dialog əməllərinin öndənməsi Dialoog sistemi in şaatı və diskursu analizi üçün əsas dil anlama görevi idi. SWBD-DAMSL kimi əvvəlki dijalog şəkilləri insan-insan söhbətlərində danışmaq analizi üçün hazırlanmışdır. Bu kağızda, a çıq-domena insan-maşına danışmaqlarına nişan edilən, MIDAS (Makin Interaction Dialog Act Scheme). MIDAS insan ortaqlarını anlamaq üçün makinelərinə kömək etmək üçün tasarlanmışdır. MIDAS hiyerarşik quruluşu var və çoxlu etiket notlarını dəstəkləyir. Biz böyük a çıq-domani insan makinesi danışan danışma verilər qurğusunu topladıq və bildirdik (24K sözlərindən olub). Bizim taslağımızı təsdiqləmək üçün çoxlu etiketli dialoğu təhsil etmək üçün transfer öyrənmə metodlarını təhsil etdik və F1 nöqtəsinə 0,79 gəldik.', 'cs': 'Predikce dialogových aktů v otevřených konverzacích je základním úkolem porozumění jazyků jak pro budování dialogového systému, tak pro analýzu diskurzu. Předchozí schémata dialogových aktů, jako je SWBD-DAMSL, jsou určeny především pro diskurzní analýzu v člověk-člověk konverzacích. V tomto článku představujeme schéma anotace dialogových aktů, MIDAS (Machine Interaction Dialog Act Scheme), zaměřené na open-domain konverzace člověk-stroj. MIDAS je navržen tak, aby pomáhal strojům zlepšit jejich schopnost porozumět lidským partnerům. MIDAS má hierarchickou strukturu a podporuje anotace s více štítky. Shromáždili jsme a anotovali rozsáhlý otevřený soubor mluvených konverzací člověk-stroj (sestávající z 24K výroků). Pro ověření našeho schématu jsme využili metody transferového učení, abychom trénovali model predikce dialogových aktů s více štítky a dosáhli F1 skóre 0,79.', 'bs': 'Predviđanje djela o dijalogu u razgovorima o otvorenom domenu je ključni zadatak razumijevanja jezika za izgradnju dijalogskih sustava i analizu diskursa. Prethodne šeme djelovanja dijaloga, poput SWBD-DAMSL, su dizajnirane uglavnom za analizu diskursa u razgovorima o ljudima i ljudima. U ovom papiru predstavljamo šemu annotacije akta dijaloga, MIDAS (Šema zakona o mašinskom interakcijskom dijalogu), ciljanu na razgovore o ljudskim mašinama otvorenom domenu. MIDAS je dizajniran da pomogne mašinama da poboljšaju svoju sposobnost razumevanja ljudskih partnera. MIDAS ima hijerarhičku strukturu i podržava višeetičke annotacije. Skupljali smo i annotirali veliku kompletu podataka o razgovoru s ljudskim strojevima otvorenom domenu (koja se sastoji od 24K govora). Da bismo potvrdili našu šemu, upotrijebili smo metode učenja prijenosa kako bi obučili model predviđanja multietičkog dijaloga i ostvarili rezultat F1 od 0,79.', 'et': 'Dialoogitoimingu ennustamine avatud domeenis vestlustes on oluline keele mõistmise ülesanne nii dialoogisüsteemi loomiseks kui ka diskursuse analüüsiks. Varasemad dialoogiaktide skeemid, näiteks SWBD-DAMSL, on mõeldud peamiselt diskursuse analüüsiks inimese-inimese vestlustes. Käesolevas töös tutvustame dialoogiakti annotatsiooniskeemi MIDAS (Machine Interaction Dialog Act Scheme), mis on suunatud avatud domeeni inimese-masina vestlustele. MIDAS on loodud selleks, et aidata masinatel paremini mõista inimpartnereid. MIDAS on hierarhiline struktuur ja toetab mitme sildiga annotatsioone. Kogusime ja kommenteerisime suure avatud domeeniga inim-masin kõneleva vestluse andmekogumi (mis koosneb 24K kõnedest). Oma skeemi valideerimiseks kasutasime siirdeõppe meetodeid, et koolitada mitme märgisega dialoogi toimingu prognoosimise mudelit ja saavutasime F1 skoori 0,79.', 'fi': 'Dialogiteon ennustaminen avoimissa keskusteluissa on keskeinen kielen ymmärtämisen tehtävä sekä dialogijärjestelmän rakentamisessa että diskurssianalyysissä. Aiemmat dialogin tekosuunnitelmat, kuten SWBD-DAMSL, on suunniteltu pääasiassa diskurssianalyysiin ihmisen ja ihmisen välisissä keskusteluissa. Tässä artikkelissa esitellään dialogi act annotation scheme, MIDAS (Machine Interaction Dialog Act Scheme), joka on suunnattu avoimen verkkotunnuksen ihmisten ja koneiden välisiin keskusteluihin. MIDAS on suunniteltu auttamaan koneita ymmärtämään ihmiskumppaneita paremmin. MIDAS on hierarkkinen rakenne ja tukee useita tunnisteita merkintöjä. Keräsimme ja kommentoimme suuren avoimen verkkotunnuksen ihmisen ja koneen puhuttua keskusteluaineistoa (joka koostuu 24K lauseista). Järjestelmämme validoimiseksi hyödynsimme siirtooppimismenetelmiä kouluttaaksemme monimerkkisen dialogin ennustusmallin ja saavutimme F1-pisteen 0,79.', 'ha': "Yi gabanin aikin zauren akwatin bayani cikin mazaɓa masu buɗe-Domen, yana da wani aikin muhimu wa tsari na tsarin zauren akwatin bayani da kuma an yi anayyar da mazaɓa. Previous dialog act schemes, such as SWBD-DAMSL, are designed mainly for discourse analysis in human-human conversations.  cikin wannan takardan da Muke ƙayyade wani shirin akwatin aiki na zauren akwatin bayani, MIDAS (Shirin Hanyar Hanyar Aiki na Kwanan Aiki na Kwanan Aiki na Kifyuta da Kayan aiki), wanda aka yi amfani da wajen gayin mazaɓa masu buɗe-Domen. MIDAS ne aka designar a taimake mashinaki dõmin ya kyautata awon su fahimta mutane. MIDAS yana da wani hierrrchical layin da yana ƙarfafa taƙaitori masu yawa. Mun sami da kuma muka yi bayani ga mutane da aka yi magana da shi mai buɗa ɗewa (masu haɗi da maganar 24,000). Domin gaske shirin ayukanmu, za'a samar da shiryoyin ayuka da aka shige su zuwa an sanar da wani motsi na zauren akwatin bayani na multi-label kuma muka kai wani scori na F1 na 0.79.", 'jv': 'Dialog action dialog-action In this paper, we present a dialog action anntations scheme, MDES (Masjian interaction Dialog Action scheme), goal at open-domain Human-device conversations. Ubuntu 12.04 politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness We gated and noted a big open-domain Human-device spoken conversation dataset (compring of 24K words). Ngubah nyanggalih nggo Kemerdekaan Winter', 'sk': 'Predvidevanje dialognega akta v odprtih pogovorih je bistvena naloga razumevanja jezika tako za gradnjo dialognega sistema kot za analizo diskurza. Prejšnje sheme dialogskih aktov, kot je SWBD-DAMSL, so namenjene predvsem analizi diskurza v človeško-človeških pogovorih. V tem prispevku predstavljamo shemo opombe dialognega akta MIDAS (Machine Interaction Dialog Act Scheme), usmerjeno v odprte domene človek-stroj pogovore. MIDAS je zasnovan za pomoč strojem pri izboljšanju njihove sposobnosti razumevanja človeških partnerjev. MIDAS ima hierarhično strukturo in podpira več oznak. Zbrali smo in označili velik nabor odprtega domena podatkov o pogovoru med človekom in strojem (sestavljen iz 24K izjav). Za potrditev naše sheme smo uporabili metode transfernega učenja za usposabljanje modela napovedovanja več oznak dialoga in dosegli rezultat F1 0,79.', 'he': 'חיזוי מעשי דיאלוג בשיחות בתחום פתוח הוא משימה חיונית להבין שפה עבור בניית מערכת דיאלוג וגם ניתוח דיבורים. מערכות מעשי דיאלוג קודמות, כמו SWBD-DAMSL, מעוצבות בעיקר לניתוח דיבורים בשיחות אנושיות-אנושיות. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים מערכת ציונים של מעשי דיאלוג, MIDAS (מערכת מערכת דיאלוג אינטראקציה של מכונות), המתכוונת לשיחות אדם-מכונות בתחום פתוח. MIDAS מעוצב כדי לעזור למכונות לשפר את היכולת שלהם להבין שותפים אנושיים. למידאס יש מבנה היררכי ותמוך בציונים רבים. אספנו והציינו קבוצת נתונים של שיחות מדברות בני אדם בשטח פתוח גדולה (מורכבת ממילות 24K). כדי לאשר את התוכנית שלנו, השתמשנו בשיטות לימוד העברה כדי לאמן מודל חזיון של מעשה דיאלוג רב-תווים ולהגיע לתוצאה F1 של 0.79.', 'bo': 'Dialog act prediction in open-domain conversations is an essential language comprehension task for both dialog system building and discourse analysis. Previous dialog act schemes, such as SWBD-DAMSL, are designed mainly for discourse analysis in human-human conversations. འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་སྣང་བྱེད་པའི་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་གྱི་འགོ་བརྗོད་དང་། MIDAS (Machine Interaction Dialog Act Scheme) MIDAS་ནི་ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱིས་མི་དང་ཆེ་མཐོང་ཆེན་སྐྱོང་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། MIDAS ལ་ཡིག་རྩིས་གཞུང་གི་དབྱིབས་སྒྲིག་བཀོད་པ་དང་ཁ་ཡིག་རྟགས་ཀྱི་སྐུལ་སྟོན་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་མི་མང་གི་ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་དོན་ཚན་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་སྐད་ཆ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་ཆས། To validate our scheme, we leveraged transfer learning methods to train a multi-label dialog act prediction model and reached an F1 score of 0.79.'}
{'en': 'Detecting Extraneous Content in Podcasts', 'es': 'Detección de contenido extraño en podcasts', 'ar': 'الكشف عن محتوى غريب في البودكاست', 'fr': 'Détection de contenu superflu dans les podcasts', 'pt': 'Detectando conteúdo estranho em podcasts', 'zh': '检播客无关', 'ja': 'ポッドキャストでの余分なコンテンツの検出', 'hi': 'पॉडकास्ट में बाहरी सामग्री का पता लगाना', 'ru': 'Обнаружение постороннего контента в подкастах', 'ga': 'Ábhar Seachtrach a Bhrath i bPodchraoltaí', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ανίχνευση ξένου περιεχομένου σε Podcasts', 'hu': 'Idegen tartalom észlelése podcastokban', 'it': 'Rilevamento di contenuti estranei nei podcast', 'lt': 'Išorinio turinio aptikimas podcastuose', 'mk': 'Детектирање на странска содржина во подкасти', 'kk': 'Подкасттарда сыртқы мазмұны анықтау', 'ms': 'Detecting Extraneous Content in Podcasts', 'ml': 'പോഡ്കാസ്റ്റിലെ കൂടുതല്\u200d ഉള്ളടക്കം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Подкастуудын гадаад хэлбэрийг мэдэх', 'mt': 'Detecting Extraneous Content in Podcasts', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie treści obcych w podcastach', 'no': 'Finn eksterne innhald i podkastar', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje izvanzemaljnog sadržaja u podkastima', 'si': 'පොඩ්කාස්ට් වලින් විශේෂ සාමාදානය හොයාගන්න', 'so': 'Raadinta waxyaabaha dheeraad ah ee Podcasts', 'ro': 'Detectarea conținutului străin în podcasturi', 'sv': 'Identifiera främmande innehåll i podcaster', 'ur': 'پوڈکاسٹ میں اضافہ منصوبہ پتچا رہا ہے', 'ta': 'போட்காஸ்ஸில் உள்ள விரிவான உள்ளடக்கங்களை கண்டுபிடிக்கும்', 'vi': 'Phát hiện nội dung lạ trong Podcasts', 'uz': 'Detecting Extraneous Content in Podcasts', 'bg': 'Откриване на чуждо съдържание в подкасти', 'nl': 'Buitengewone inhoud detecteren in podcasts', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje izvanzemaljnog sadržaja u podkastima', 'id': 'Mengeteksi Konten Luar dalam Podcast', 'ko': '팟캐스트에서 무관한 내용 탐지', 'fa': 'شناسایی محتوای خارجی در پودکاستها', 'sw': 'Kugundua Content Extreme in Podcasts', 'da': 'Registrering af fremmed indhold i podcasts', 'tr': "%s'i a챌yl첵채:", 'af': 'Kies eksterne inhoud in podkaste', 'de': 'Erkennung fremder Inhalte in Podcasts', 'az': 'Podkastlar i칞톛risind톛 D톛rgahl캼 M톛zmun se칞iliyor', 'sq': 'Duke zbuluar përmbajtjen e jashtme në Podcasts', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'hy': 'Պոդկաստաններում արտաքին պարունակություն հայտնաբերելը', 'cs': 'Detekce cizího obsahu v podcastech', 'bn': 'পডক্যাস্টের মধ্যে এক্সট্রেনিয়োস বিষয়বস্তু সনাক্ত করা হচ্ছে', 'fi': 'Vieraan sisällön tunnistaminen podcasteissa', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje izvanrednog sadržaja u podcastima', 'ca': 'Detectar contingut estrany en podcasts', 'et': 'Võõra sisu tuvastamine podcastides', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'he': 'Detecting Extraneous Content in Podcasts', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Zaznavanje tuje vsebine v podcastih', 'bo': 'Podcasts ནང་དུ་ཕྱིར་འདོན་པའི་ནང་དོན་འཚོལ་བཤེར་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Podcast episodes often contain material extraneous to the main content, such as advertisements, interleaved within the audio and the written descriptions. We present classifiers that leverage both textual and listening patterns in order to detect such content in podcast descriptions and audio transcripts. We demonstrate that our models are effective by evaluating them on the downstream task of podcast summarization and show that we can substantively improve ROUGE scores and reduce the extraneous content generated in the summaries.', 'fr': "Les épisodes de podcast contiennent souvent des éléments extérieurs au contenu principal, tels que des publicités, entrelacées dans l'audio et les descriptions écrites. Nous présentons des classificateurs qui exploitent à la fois les modèles textuels et d'écoute afin de détecter ce type de contenu dans les descriptions de podcasts et les transcriptions audio. Nous démontrons que nos modèles sont efficaces en les évaluant sur la tâche en aval de la synthèse des podcasts et montrons que nous pouvons améliorer considérablement les scores ROUGE et réduire le contenu superflu généré dans les résumés.", 'ar': 'غالبًا ما تحتوي حلقات البودكاست على مواد غريبة عن المحتوى الرئيسي ، مثل الإعلانات ، متداخلة داخل الصوت والأوصاف المكتوبة. نقدم المصنفات التي تستفيد من كل من الأنماط النصية وأنماط الاستماع من أجل اكتشاف مثل هذا المحتوى في أوصاف البودكاست والنصوص الصوتية. نبرهن على أن نماذجنا فعالة من خلال تقييمها في مهمة تلخيص البث الصوتي وإظهار أنه يمكننا تحسين نتائج ROUGE وتقليل المحتوى الدخيل الناتج في الملخصات.', 'es': 'Los episodios de podcast a menudo contienen material ajeno al contenido principal, como anuncios, intercalados dentro del audio y las descripciones escritas. Presentamos clasificadores que aprovechan los patrones textuales y de escucha para detectar dicho contenido en las descripciones de los podcasts y en las transcripciones de audio. Demostramos que nuestros modelos son efectivos al evaluarlos en la tarea posterior de resumir los podcasts y demostramos que podemos mejorar sustancialmente las puntuaciones de ROUGE y reducir el contenido extraño generado en los resúmenes.', 'pt': 'Os episódios de podcast geralmente contêm material estranho ao conteúdo principal, como anúncios, intercalados no áudio e nas descrições escritas. Apresentamos classificadores que utilizam padrões textuais e de escuta para detectar esse conteúdo em descrições de podcasts e transcrições de áudio. Demonstramos que nossos modelos são eficazes ao avaliá-los na tarefa downstream de resumo de podcast e mostramos que podemos melhorar substancialmente as pontuações do ROUGE e reduzir o conteúdo estranho gerado nos resumos.', 'zh': '播客剧集凡大体无关材用,如广告,交错于音频书面描述。 凡器用文收听式,检于播客音频脚本。 论播客之下流,以效其实质性ROUGE分而损摘要之生也。', 'ja': 'ポッドキャストのエピソードには、多くの場合、オーディオと書かれた説明の中に広告など、メインコンテンツとは関係のない素材が含まれています。私たちは、ポッドキャストの説明や音声トランスクリプトでそのようなコンテンツを検出するために、テキストパターンとリスニングパターンの両方を活用する分類子を提示します。私たちは、ポッドキャストの要約の下流タスクでモデルを評価することによって効果的であることを示し、ルージュスコアを実質的に改善し、要約で生成された余分なコンテンツを減らすことができることを示します。', 'hi': 'पॉडकास्ट एपिसोड में अक्सर मुख्य सामग्री के लिए बाहरी सामग्री होती है, जैसे कि विज्ञापन, ऑडियो और लिखित विवरणों के भीतर इंटरलीव किए गए। हम क्लासिफायरप्रस्तुत करते हैं जो पॉडकास्ट विवरण और ऑडियो टेपों में ऐसी सामग्री का पता लगाने के लिए पाठ्य और सुनने के पैटर्न दोनों का लाभ उठाते हैं। हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि हमारे मॉडल पॉडकास्ट सारांशीकरण के डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्य पर उनका मूल्यांकन करके प्रभावी हैं और दिखाते हैं कि हम मूल रूप से रूज स्कोर में सुधार कर सकते हैं और सारांश में उत्पन्न बाहरी सामग्री को कम कर सकते हैं।', 'ru': 'Эпизоды подкастов часто содержат материалы, не относящиеся к основному контенту, такие как реклама, переплетающиеся в аудио и письменные описания. Мы представляем классификаторы, которые используют как текстовые, так и прослушивающие шаблоны для обнаружения такого контента в описаниях подкастов и аудиозаписях. Мы демонстрируем, что наши модели эффективны, оценивая их на последующем задании обобщения подкастов, и показываем, что мы можем существенно улучшить оценки ROUGE и уменьшить посторонний контент, генерируемый в резюме.', 'ga': 'Is minic a bhíonn ábhar seachránach leis an bpríomhábhar i eipeasóidí podchraolta, mar fhógraí, idirdhuilleogach laistigh den fhuaim agus de na tuairiscí scríofa. Cuirimid aicmitheoirí i láthair a ghiaráil patrúin théacsúla agus éisteachta araon chun a leithéid d’ábhar a bhrath i gcur síos podchraoltaí agus tras-scríbhinní fuaime. Léirímid go bhfuil ár múnlaí éifeachtach trí iad a mheas ar an tasc iartheachtach a bhaineann le hachoimriú podchraoltaí agus taispeánaimid gur féidir linn scóir ROUGE a fheabhsú go substaintiúil agus an t-ábhar coimhthíoch a ghintear sna hachoimrí a laghdú.', 'ka': 'პოდისკოსტის ეპიზოდიები ზოგიერთად აქვს მატერიალური ექსტრენო მნიშვნელობისთვის, როგორც აკლაპტისმენტები, ანუ აუდისოში და წერილი აღწერების შორ ჩვენ კლასიფიკაციებს, რომლებიც ტექსტულ და სურათების შაბლონებს გამოიყენებენ, რომლებიც ასეთი შემდგომარები პოდიკასტის გამოსახულებაში და ასეთი ტრანქრიპ ჩვენ მოდენსურებთ, რომ ჩვენი მოდელები ეფექტიურია, რომლებიც ისინი პოდენკასტის კუნძექტურაციაზე გავამუშავებთ და ჩვენ შეგვიძლია ძალიან გავამუშავოთ ROUGE წერტილებები და გავამუშავოთ', 'hu': 'A podcast epizódok gyakran tartalmaznak olyan anyagokat, amelyek a fő tartalomtól kívül esnek, mint például a reklámok, amelyeket a hang és az írásbeli leírások között kölcsönöznek. Olyan osztályozókat mutatunk be, amelyek mind a szöveges, mind a hallgatási mintákat kihasználják annak érdekében, hogy felismerjék ezeket a tartalmakat podcast leírásokban és hangátiratokban. Bemutatjuk, hogy modelleink hatékonyak, értékeljük őket a podcast összefoglalásának downstream feladatában, és megmutatjuk, hogy jelentősen javíthatjuk a ROUGE pontszámokat és csökkenthetjük az összefoglalókban létrehozott idegen tartalmakat.', 'it': "Gli episodi di podcast spesso contengono materiale estraneo al contenuto principale, come pubblicità, interlacciato all'interno dell'audio e delle descrizioni scritte. Presentiamo classificatori che sfruttano sia i modelli testuali che di ascolto al fine di rilevare tali contenuti nelle descrizioni dei podcast e nelle trascrizioni audio. Dimostriamo che i nostri modelli sono efficaci valutandoli sul compito a valle della sintesi podcast e dimostriamo che siamo in grado di migliorare notevolmente i punteggi ROUGE e ridurre i contenuti estranei generati nei riassunti.", 'kk': 'Подкасттың эпизодтары көбінде негізгі мазмұнына, мысалы, рекламалары, аудио және жазылған сипаттамалар ішінде арналған материал болады. Подкасттың сипаттамасын және аудио транскрипттерінің мазмұнын анықтау үшін мәтін және тыңдау үлгілерін көмектесетін классификаторларды таңдаймыз. Біз үлгілеріміздің бағалау тапсырмасын бағалап, оларды бағалау тапсырмасына ең әсер етеді деп көрсетедік. Біз ROUGE нәтижелерін негізінде жақсартып, қосымша мазмұнын түсіргендіруге болады.', 'lt': 'Podcast episodes often contain material extraneous to the main content, such as advertisements, interleaved within the audio and the written descriptions.  Mes pristatome klasifikatorius, kurie naudoja tekstinius ir klausymo modelius, kad būtų galima nustatyti tokį turinį podcast aprašuose ir garso transkriptuose. Mes įrodome, kad mūsų modeliai yra veiksmingi vertindami juos atliekant tolesnę podcast apibendrinimo užduotį ir parodysime, kad galime iš esmės pagerinti ROUGE rezultatus ir sumažinti eksternalų turinį, susidariusį santraukose.', 'mk': 'Подкасните епизоди честопати содржат материјал надворешен од главната содржина, како што се рекламите, меѓусебно пропуштени во аудиото и пишуваните описи. Презентираме класификатори кои влијаат на текстуалните и слушачките модели со цел да ја детектираат ваквата содржина во описите на podcast и аудио транскриптите. We demonstrate that our models are effective by evaluating them on the downstream task of podcast summarization and show that we can substantively improve ROUGE scores and reduce the extraneous content generated in the summaries.', 'el': 'Τα επεισόδια περιέχουν συχνά υλικό ξένο από το κύριο περιεχόμενο, όπως διαφημίσεις, που διασυνδέονται μέσα στον ήχο και τις γραπτές περιγραφές. Παρουσιάζουμε ταξινομητές που αξιοποιούν τόσο τα κείμενα όσο και τα ακουστικά πρότυπα για να ανιχνεύσουν τέτοιο περιεχόμενο σε περιγραφές και ηχογραφήσεις. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι τα μοντέλα μας είναι αποτελεσματικά αξιολογώντας τα στο μεταγενέστερο έργο της σύνοψης και δείχνουν ότι μπορούμε ουσιαστικά να βελτιώσουμε τις βαθμολογίες και να μειώσουμε το εξωτερικό περιεχόμενο που δημιουργείται στις περιλήψεις.', 'ms': 'Episod podcast sering mengandungi bahan yang luar biasa ke kandungan utama, seperti iklan, terlibat dalam audio dan deskripsi tertulis. Kami perkenalkan pengklasifikasi yang menggunakan corak teks dan pendengaran untuk mengesan kandungan tersebut dalam deskripsi podcast dan transkrip audio. Kami menunjukkan bahawa model kami adalah berkesan dengan menilai mereka pada tugas turun dari ringkasan podcast dan menunjukkan bahawa kita boleh meningkatkan nilai ROUGE secara substantif dan mengurangkan kandungan luar biasa yang dijana dalam ringkasan.', 'ml': 'പോഡ്കാസ്റ്റ് എപ്പിസോഡുകളില്\u200d പലപ്പോഴും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങളിലേക്ക് അധികമായി ഉള്ളതാണ്.  We present classifiers that leverage both textual and listening patterns in order to detect such content in podcast descriptions and audio transcripts.  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പോഡ്കാസ്റ്റ് ചുരുക്കത്തിന്\u200dറെ അടുത്തുള്ള ജോലിയില്\u200d അതിനെ വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് കൊണ്ട് പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തമാക്കുന', 'mt': 'Podcast episodes often contain material extraneous to the main content, such as advertisements, interleaved within the audio and the written descriptions.  We present classifiers that leverage both textual and listening patterns in order to detect such content in podcast descriptions and audio transcripts.  Aħna nuru li l-mudelli tagħna huma effettivi billi jivvalutawhom fuq il-kompitu downstream tas-sommarju tal-podcast u nuru li nistgħu ntejbu sostantivament il-punteġġi ROUGE u jnaqqsu l-kontenut estranju ġġenerat fis-sommarji.', 'mn': 'Подкаст хэвлэлүүд ихэвчлэн үндсэн хэвлэлүүдэд маш олон материал байдаг. Яг л реклам, дуу болон бичигдсэн тайлбаруудын дотор орхигдсон. Бид текст болон сонсох загваруудыг хөгжүүлэх хэлбэрүүдийг Подкаст тодорхойлолтууд болон аудио транскриптуудыг олж мэдэхэд хэрэглэдэг. Бид моделуудыг бага зэрэг Podcast жишээлбэлийн даалгаврыг үнэлэхээр үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулж, бид ROUGE тоонуудыг сайжруулж, жишээлбэлд гаргасан гайхалтай contentsыг багасгаж чадна.', 'pl': 'Odcinki podcastów często zawierają materiały poza główną treścią, takie jak reklamy, przeplatane w dźwięku i opisy pisemne. Prezentujemy klasyfikatory, które wykorzystują zarówno wzorce tekstowe, jak i słuchowe do wykrywania takich treści w opisach podcastów i transkrypcjach audio. Wykazujemy, że nasze modele są skuteczne, oceniając je na dalszym zadaniu podcastów i pokazujemy, że możemy merytorycznie poprawić wyniki ROUGE i zmniejszyć treści obce generowane w streszczeniach.', 'no': 'Podcast-episodar inneheld ofte materiale ekstra til hovudinnhaldet, som reklamar, mellom lyden og skrivne skildringar. Vi presenterer klassifikatorar som leverer både tekstumønsterer og lyttamønsterer for å finna slike innhaldet i podkastforskrifter og lyd-transkripter. Vi demonstrerer at modellen våre er effektiv ved å evaluera dei på nedstrømte oppgåva for samandringa av podkast og vise at vi kan forbetra ROUGE- poeng og redusera det ekstra innhaldet som er generert i samandringane.', 'sr': 'Podcast epizode često sadrže vanzemaljski materijal za glavni sadržaj, kao što su reklame, uključene unutar zvuka i pisanih opisa. Predstavljamo klasifikatore koji utiču na tekstualne i slušne obrasce kako bi otkrili takvu sadržaj u opisu podkasta i audio transkriptima. Pokazujemo da su naši modeli efikasni procjenjivanjem njihovih zadataka o smanjenju podkasta i pokazujemo da možemo značajno poboljšati rezultate ROUGE-a i smanjiti izvanredni sadržaj koji je proizveden u sažetama.', 'si': 'පොඩ්කාස්ට් වලින් ප්\u200dරධාන සාමාන්ත්\u200dරයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරධාන සාමාන්ත්\u200dරයක්, වගේම ප්\u200dරධාන සාමාන්ත්\u200dරයක්, ශා අපි පොඩ්කාස්ට් විස්තරණය සහ ශ්\u200dරමාණ විස්තරණය සඳහා අහන්න පෙට්ටර් දෙන්නම් පෙන්වන්න ලැබෙනවා. අපි පැහැදිලි කරනවා අපේ මොඩල් ප්\u200dරභාවිත විදියට පොඩ්කාස්ට් සංවිධානය සඳහා ඔවුන්ව අවශ්\u200dය කරනවා කියලා පෙන්වන්න අපිට ROUGE සංවිධානය', 'ro': 'Episoadele podcast conțin adesea materiale străine conținutului principal, cum ar fi reclamele, interleagate în audio și descrierile scrise. Prezentăm clasificatori care utilizează atât modele textuale, cât și modele de ascultare pentru a detecta astfel de conținut în descrierile podcast-urilor și transcrierile audio. Demonstrăm că modelele noastre sunt eficiente evaluându-le pe sarcina din aval a rezumatului podcast-urilor și arătăm că putem îmbunătăți substanțial scorurile ROUGE și reduce conținutul străin generat în rezumate.', 'ta': 'போட்காஸ்ட் நிகழ்வுகள் பெரும்பாலாக முக்கிய உள்ளடக்கத்திற்கு பொருள் அதிகமாக இருக்கும், போன்ற அறிவிப்பு, ஒலிக்குள் மற்ற போட்காஸ் விவரிப்புகள் மற்றும் ஒலி எழுத்துக்குறிப்புகளில் உள்ள உள்ளடக்கங்களை கண்டுபிடிக்க முடியும் என்று நாம் வகுப்பாட நாம் எங்கள் மாதிரிகள் செயல்படுத்தும் போட்காஸ் சுருக்கத்தின் கீழே செயலை மதிப்பிடும் மற்றும் காண்பிக்கிறது நாம் மெய்யாகவே ROUGE மதிப்புகளை மேம்படுத்', 'sv': 'Podcastavsnitt innehåller ofta material som är främmande för huvudinnehållet, till exempel annonser, som sammanflätas i ljudet och de skriftliga beskrivningarna. Vi presenterar klassificerare som utnyttjar både text- och lyssningsmönster för att upptäcka sådant innehåll i podcastbeskrivningar och ljudavskrifter. Vi visar att våra modeller är effektiva genom att utvärdera dem på nedströmsuppgiften för podcastsammanfattning och visar att vi väsentligt kan förbättra ROUGE poäng och minska det främmande innehåll som genereras i sammanfattningarna.', 'so': 'Goobaha warqadda Podcast inta badan waxaa ku yaala alaab aad u badan oo ku qoran waxyaabaha ugu hooseeya, tusaale ahaan ogeysiiska, mid ku qoran codsiga iyo qoraalka. Waxaynu soo bandhignaa fasalada qoraalka iyo dhegaysta, si aan u ogaano waxyaabaha caynkaas ah oo ku qoran qoraalka podcast iyo qoraalka codsiga. Waxaynu muujinnaa in qaababkayagu ay faa’iido u leeyihiin si ay ugu qiimeeyaan xafiiska hoose ee podcast, waxaana muujinnaa in aan si fiican u kordhin karno qiimeyaasha ROUGE iyo hoos u dhigi karno waxyaabaha aad u badan ee xagaaga.', 'ur': 'پوڈکاسٹ اپیسوڈ کثرت وقت اصلی منصوبات کے لئے غیر اضافی مواد لگاتے ہیں، جیسے آڈیو اور لکھی توصیف کے اندر پھیرے جاتے ہیں۔ ہم کلاسیفوں کو پیش کرتے ہیں جو پڈکاسٹ کی توصیف اور اوڈیو ترنسکرپٹوں میں ایسی موجود کو پہچان سکتے ہیں۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارے نمڈلے ان کو پوڈکاسٹ کے ذریعہ اندازے کے ذریعہ تحقیق کرنے کے ذریعہ اثر دیتے ہیں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہم ROUGE اسکوروں کو زیادہ بہتر کر سکتے ہیں اور اسکوروں میں جوڑے ہوئے extraneous content کو کم کر سکتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Biz podcast taʼriflari va audio skriptlarda shu tarkibini aniqlash uchun matn va tinglash usullarini ko'rsatuvchimiz. Biz modellarimiz ularni podcast tahrirlash jarayonini qiymatlashimiz mumkin va hozirga yaratilgan kichkina tarkibini ko'rsatishimiz mumkin.", 'vi': 'Trong các giai đoạn giai đoạn giai đoạn giai đoạn giai đoạn giai đoạn chứa vật chất không liên quan tới nội dung chính, như quảng cáo, giữa đoạn âm thanh và thuật ngữ. Chúng tôi đưa ra các phân loại có thể ảnh hưởng cả các mô hình kết cấu lẫn các mẫu lắng nghe để phát hiện nội dung này trong mô tả bục và các đoạn ghi âm. Chúng tôi chứng minh rằng các mô hình của chúng tôi có hiệu quả bằng cách đánh giá chúng về công việc tổng kết bằng bục diễn tả và cho thấy rằng chúng tôi có thể cải tiến sâu sắc số lượng của ROG và giảm các nội dung thừa trong các bản tóm tắt.', 'nl': 'Podcast afleveringen bevatten vaak materiaal dat niet aan de hoofdinhoud gerelateerd is, zoals advertenties, die tussen de audio en de geschreven beschrijvingen zijn verstrengeld. We presenteren classificatoren die gebruik maken van zowel tekst- als luisterpatronen om dergelijke inhoud te detecteren in podcastbeschrijvingen en audio-transcripties. We tonen aan dat onze modellen effectief zijn door ze te evalueren op de downstream taak van podcast samenvatting en laten zien dat we ROUGE scores substantieel kunnen verbeteren en de externe inhoud die in de samenvattingen wordt gegenereerd, kunnen verminderen.', 'bg': 'Подкаст епизодите често съдържат материали, които не са свързани с основното съдържание, като например реклами, преплитани в аудиото и писмените описания. Представяме класификатори, които използват както текстови, така и слушателни модели, за да откриват такова съдържание в описания на подкаст и аудио транскрипции. Ние демонстрираме, че нашите модели са ефективни, като ги оценяваме на задачата надолу по веригата за обобщаване на подкастите и показваме, че можем значително да подобрим резултатите и да намалим външното съдържание, генерирано в резюметата.', 'da': 'Podcastepisoder indeholder ofte materiale uden for hovedindholdet, såsom reklamer, der er indblandet i lyden og de skriftlige beskrivelser. Vi præsenterer klassikere, der udnytter både tekst- og lyttemønstre for at opdage sådant indhold i podcastbeskrivelser og lydudskrifter. Vi demonstrerer, at vores modeller er effektive ved at evaluere dem på downstream opgaven med podcast opsummering og viser, at vi kan forbedre ROUGE scores væsentligt og reducere det fremmede indhold genereret i resuméerne.', 'hr': 'Podcast epizode često sadrže izvanredni materijal glavnog sadržaja, poput reklame, interleased unutar zvuka i pisanih opisa. Predstavljamo klasifikatore koji utječu na tekstualne i slušne uzorke kako bi otkrili takav sadržaj u opisu podkasta i audio transkriptama. Pokazujemo da su naši modeli učinkoviti procjenjivanjem njihovih podkasta na donjem zadatku sažetka podkasta i pokazujemo da možemo značajno poboljšati rezultate ROUGE-a i smanjiti izvanredni sadržaj proizveden u sažetkama.', 'de': 'Podcast-Episoden enthalten oft Material, das nicht zum Hauptinhalt gehört, wie z.B. Werbung, die im Audio und in den schriftlichen Beschreibungen ineinander übergeht. Wir präsentieren Klassifikatoren, die sowohl Text- als auch Hörmuster nutzen, um solche Inhalte in Podcast-Beschreibungen und Audio-Transkripten zu erkennen. Wir zeigen, dass unsere Modelle effektiv sind, indem wir sie an der nachgelagerten Aufgabe der Podcastzusammenfassung evaluieren und zeigen, dass wir ROUGE Scores substanziell verbessern und die in den Zusammenfassungen generierten Fremdinhalte reduzieren können.', 'sw': 'Makala ya Podikasti mara nyingi huwa na vifaa vya kutosha kwa maudhui muhimu, kama vile matangazo, yaliyoingizwa ndani ya sauti na maelezo yaliyoandikwa. Tunawasilisha wataalamu ambao wanatumia mbinu za maandishi na kusikiliza ili kugundua maudhui kama hayo katika maelezo ya podikasti na kuandika kwa sauti. Tunaonyesha kuwa mifano yetu imekuwa na ufanisi kwa kutathmini katika kazi ya mto wa muhtasari wa podikasti na kuonyesha kwamba tunaweza kuboresha viwango vya UKIMWI na kupunguza maudhui yanayozaliwa kwa kiangazi cha muhtasari.', 'id': 'Episode podcast sering mengandung bahan luar biasa ke isi utama, seperti iklan, interleaved dalam audio dan deskripsi tertulis. Kami mempersembahkan klasifikasi yang mempengaruhi pola tekstual dan pendengaran untuk mendeteksi konten tersebut dalam deskripsi podcast dan transkrip audio. Kami menunjukkan bahwa model kita efektif dengan mengevaluasi mereka pada tugas turun dari penjelasan podcast dan menunjukkan bahwa kita dapat meningkatkan nilai ROUGE secara substantif dan mengurangi isi luar biasa yang dihasilkan dalam ringkasan.', 'af': 'Podkaste episodes bevat dikwels materiaal uitgeleë vir die hoofinhoud, soos advertensies, onderbreek binne die oudio en die skryfde beskrywings. Ons voorsien klassifiseerders wat beide tekstuele en luister patrone verwyder om sodanige inhoud in podkaste beskrywings en oudio-transkripte te ontdek. Ons wys dat ons modele effektief is deur hulle te evalueer op die onderstreem taak van podcast opsomming en te wys dat ons kan substantief die ROUGE opsommings verbeter en die eksterne inhoud wat in die opsommings genereer is verduur.', 'tr': 'Podcast täzelikleri kän esasy maksada taýýarlanan materiýaly, täzelikler, ses we ýazylan deskripler bilen sözülenýär. Biz bu şekilde podcast taslamaları ve ses çerşitlerini tespit etmek için her metin ve dinleme şartlarını etkinleştirdik. Biziň modellerimiz olary podcast toplantynyň aşağı täsirinde baýlaşyp täsirli bolandygyny görkeýäris we olaryň ROUGE notlaryny gowylaşdyryp biljegimizi we sumatlarda üretilen aşkar maksadyny azaltyp biljegimizi görkeýäris.', 'sq': 'Episodet e podcast shpesh përmbajnë materiale të jashtme përmbajtjes kryesore, të tilla si reklamat, të ndërshkruara brenda audio dhe përshkrimeve të shkruara. Ne paraqesim klasifikuesit që përdorin si modelet tekstuale ashtu edhe të dëgjimit me qëllim që të zbulojnë përmbajtje të tilla në përshkrimet e podcast dhe transkriptet audio. Ne demonstrojmë se modelet tona janë të efektshëm duke i vlerësuar ato në detyrën poshtë të përmbledhjes së podcast dhe duke treguar se ne mund të përmirësojmë në mënyrë substantive rezultatet ROUGE dhe të reduktojmë përmbajtjen e jashtme të gjeneruar në përmbledhjet.', 'ko': '팟캐스트 에피소드는 일반적으로 광고와 같은 주요 내용과 무관한 내용을 포함하고 오디오와 서면 묘사에 삽입한다.우리가 제시한 분류기는 텍스트와 듣기 모드를 이용하여 팟캐스트 설명과 오디오 녹음 중의 이런 내용을 측정한다.우리는 팟캐스트 요약의 하위 임무에서 모델을 평가함으로써 우리의 모델이 효과적임을 증명하고 연지 평점을 현저하게 높일 수 있으며 요약에서 발생하는 무관한 내용을 줄일 수 있음을 나타낸다.', 'fa': 'بخش\u200cهای پودکاست اغلب مواد خارجی برای محتوای اصلی دارند، مانند تبلیغات، در داخل صدا و توضیح نوشته شده\u200cاند. ما راهنمایی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که الگوهای متن و گوش می\u200cدهند تا این محتویات را در توضیح\u200cهای پودکاست و ترجمه\u200cهای صدا شناسایی کنند. ما نشان می دهیم که مدلهای ما با ارزیابی آنها بر روی کار پایین پایین پودکاستی موثر هستند و نشان می دهیم که می توانیم امتیاز ROUGE را زیادی بهتر کنیم و محتوای خارجی که تولید شده در جمعیت ها کاهش دهیم.', 'hy': 'Podcast-ի դեպքերը հաճախ պարունակում են գլխավոր պարունակությունը, ինչպիսիք են գովազդները, որոնք փոխանցվում են ձայնի և գրված նկարագրությունների մեջ: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք դասակարգեր, որոնք օգտագործում են տեքստալ և լսողական կաղապարները, որպեսզի հայտնաբերեն նման պարունակությունը Podcast նկարագրություններում և ձայնային գրառումներում: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր մոդելները արդյունավետ են, գնահատելով դրանք Podcast համառոտագրման հետագա խնդրի վրա և ցույց տալով, որ մենք կարող ենք նշանակալիորեն բարելավել ROUGe-ի գնահատականները և նվազեցնել արտաքին պարունակությունը, որը ստեղծվում է համառոտագրություններ', 'az': 'Podcast epizodları sık-sık müəyyən məlumatlarına bağlı materyal içərir, məlumatlar kimi, səsində və yazılı tanımlamalar içərisində uzaqlaşdırılır. Biz bu məlumatları podcast tərzlərində və audi transkriptlərində tanıtmaq üçün məlumatları hər tərəfdən və dinləmə örtüklərini təşkil edirik. Biz modellərimizin onları podcast summarizasyonun düşürülmüş işində təşkil edərək etkili olduğunu göstərir və göstəririk ki, biz ROUGE nöqtələrini çox yaxşılaşdıra bilərik və qeydələrdə ürəklənmiş extra məlumatları azalda bilərik.', 'bn': 'পোডকাস্টের পরিস্থিতি প্রায়শই প্রধান বিষয়বস্তুর প্রতি বিজ্ঞাপন, যেমন অডিও ও এবং লিখিত বিবরণের মধ্যে লিখে আছে। পোডকাস্টের বর্ণনা এবং অডিও ট্রান্সপ্রিপ্টে এই ধরনের বিষয়বস্তু সনাক্ত করার জন্য আমরা শ্রেণীদের উপস্থাপন করছি। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের মডেল কার্যকর হয়েছে পডকাস্টের সারসংক্ষেপের কাজে মূল্যায়ন করে এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে আমরা সত্যিই রোজের স্কোর উন্নতি করতে পারি এবং সার্গারে তৈর', 'bs': 'Podcast epizode često sadrže izvanredni materijal glavnog sadržaja, kao što su reklame, uključeni unutar zvuka i pisanih opisa. Predstavljamo klasifikatore koji utiču na tekstualne i slušne obrasce kako bi otkrili takvo sadržanje u opisima podkasta i audio transkriptima. Pokazujemo da su naši modeli efikasni procjenjivanjem njihovih zadataka smanjenja podkasta i pokazujemo da možemo značajno poboljšati rezultate ROUGE-a i smanjiti izvanredni sadržaj koji je proizveden u sažetama.', 'cs': 'Epizody podcastů často obsahují materiály mimo hlavní obsah, například reklamy, které se prolínají v rámci zvuku a písemného popisu. Představujeme klasifikátory, které využívají textových i poslechových vzorů k detekci takového obsahu v popisech podcastů a zvukových přepisech. Dokazujeme, že naše modely jsou efektivní tím, že je vyhodnocujeme na následném úkolu shrnutí podcastů a ukazujeme, že můžeme podstatně zlepšit ROUGE skóre a snížit cizí obsah generovaný v souhrnech.', 'et': 'Podcasti episoodid sisaldavad sageli põhisisule mitteseotud materjale, nagu reklaamid, mis on vaheldatud helis ja kirjalikes kirjeldustes. Esitleme klassifitseerijaid, mis kasutavad nii teksti- kui kuulamismustreid, et tuvastada sellist sisu podcasti kirjeldustes ja helitranskriptsioonides. Näitame, et meie mudelid on efektiivsed, hinnates neid podcastide kokkuvõtliku ülesande osas, ning näitame, et suudame oluliselt parandada ROUGE skoore ja vähendada kokkuvõtetes loodud kõrvalist sisu.', 'fi': 'Podcast-jaksot sisältävät usein sisällölle vierasta materiaalia, kuten mainoksia, jotka on liitetty ääneen ja kirjallisiin kuvauksiin. Esittelemme luokittelijoita, jotka hyödyntävät sekä teksti- että kuuntelumalleja tunnistaakseen tällaisen sisällön podcast-kuvauksissa ja äänitranskriptioissa. Osoitamme, että mallimme ovat tehokkaita arvioimalla niitä podcastien yhteenvedon loppupään tehtävässä ja osoitamme, että voimme merkittävästi parantaa ROUGE-pisteitä ja vähentää yhteenvedoissa syntyvää vierasta sisältöä.', 'am': 'Podcast episodes often extra material to the main content, such as advertising, በድምጽ እና በጽሑፉ ጽሑፎች ውስጥ በመጠቀም ይኖራል፡፡ የጽሑፍ እና የመስማት ዓይነቶችን እና የፖዲካስስ ጽሑፎችንና የድምፅ ጽሑፎችን ለማግኘት እናደርጋለን፡፡ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'ca': "Els episodis de podcast sovint contenen material extrany al contingut principal, com els anuncis, intercalats dins l'àudio i les descripcions escrites. Presentam classificadors que utilitzen patrons textuals i d'escolta per detectar aquest contingut en descripcions de podcast i transcripcions d'àudio. Demonstrem que els nostres models són efectius evaluant-los en la tasca aval de la somària de podcasts i demostrant que podem millorar sustantivament les puntuacions ROUGE i reduir el contingut extrany generat en els somàries.", 'jv': 'podcast string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk modellé awak dhéwé nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe dadi podcast sumulasi lan wong dhéwé iso nggawe barang langgar tarjamahan Rong egal dumadhi lan soko nggawe barang dumadhi sing luwih dumadhi cah dumadhi sing luwih dumadhi uwong', 'ha': 'Akwai takardar Podcast ana ƙunsa da abun bayani zuwa maɓallin muhimma, kamar kunyari, da aka haɗa a cikin sauti da rubũtun kwamfyuta. Tuna halatar da masallatai waɗanda ke samar da wasu misãlai na rubutu da saurãre dõmin su gane cikin takardun takardar da takardun saurãre. Tuna nũna misãlai masu amfani da su yana iya ƙidãya su a cikin aikin da aka ƙara fassarar littafan Podcast kuma ke nuna cewa za mu kyautata matsayin RUGE mai girma kuma mu ƙara ƙanshi na ƙaranci da aka samar da shi a ƙari.', 'he': 'פרקי Podcast לעתים קרובות מכילים חומר מחוץ לתוכן העיקרי, כמו פרסומות, שולחות ביחד בתוך האודיו והתיאורים הכתובים. אנו מציגים מסווגים שמשפכים גם דפוסי טקסט וגם דפוסי הקשיבה כדי לזהות תוכן כזה בתיאורי פודגסט ותסריטים אודיו. אנו מראים שהדוגמנים שלנו יעילים על ידי הערכה שלהם על המשימה המאוחרת של סדרת הפודקסט ולהראות שאנחנו יכולים לשפר באופן משמעותי את נקודות ROUGE ולפחות את התוכן החיצוני שנוצר בסדרות.', 'sk': 'Epizode podcastov pogosto vsebujejo gradivo, ki ni povezano z glavno vsebino, kot so oglasi, ki so vključeni v zvok in pisne opise. Predstavljamo klasifikatorje, ki uporabljajo besedilne in poslušalne vzorce, da bi takšne vsebine zaznali v opisih podcastov in avdio transkripcijah. Dokazujemo, da so naši modeli učinkoviti tako, da jih ocenjujemo pri nadaljnji nalogi povzetka podcastov in dokazujemo, da lahko bistveno izboljšamo ROUGE rezultate in zmanjšamo tujo vsebino, ustvarjeno v povzetkih.', 'bo': 'Podcast episodes often contain material extraneous to the main content, such as advertisements, interleaved in the audio and the written descriptions. ང་ཚོས་ཡིག We demonstrate that our models are effective by evaluating them on the downstream task of podcast summarization and show that we can substantially improve ROUGE scores and reduce the extraneous content generated in the summaries.'}
{'en': 'Joint Learning of Representations for Web-tables, Entities and Types using Graph Convolutional Network', 'ar': 'التعلم المشترك للتمثيلات لجداول الويب والكيانات والأنواع باستخدام شبكة الرسم التلافيفية', 'pt': 'Aprendizagem Conjunta de Representações para Web-tables, Entidades e Tipos usando Graph Convolutional Network', 'es': 'Aprendizaje conjunto de representaciones para tablas web, entidades y tipos mediante Graph Convolutional Network', 'fr': "Apprentissage conjoint des représentations pour les tables Web, les entités et les types à l'aide du réseau convolutif de graphes", 'ja': 'グラフ畳み込みネットワークを使用したWebテーブル、エンティティ、およびタイプの表現の共同学習', 'zh': '用图卷积网络合学 Web 表、实体', 'ru': 'Совместное изучение представлений для веб-таблиц, сущностей и типов с использованием сети свертки графиков', 'hi': 'ग्राफ कनवल्शनल नेटवर्क का उपयोग करके वेब-तालिकाओं, निकायों और प्रकारों के लिए अभ्यावेदन का संयुक्त अधिगम', 'ga': "Comhfhoghlaim Léiriúcháin do tháblaí Gréasáin, d'Eintitis agus do Chineálacha ag baint úsáide as Líonra Comhthionólach Graf", 'ka': 'საბოლოო ცხრილის, ელემენტების და ტიპების გამოყენებელი გრაფიკური ქსელის გამოყენებელი გარეშე', 'el': 'Κοινή εκμάθηση αναπαραστάσεων για πίνακες ιστού, οντότητες και τύπους με χρήση του συνδυαστικού δικτύου γραφήματος', 'hu': 'Webes táblák, entitások és típusok reprezentációinak közös tanulása grafikus konzoluális hálózat segítségével', 'it': 'Apprendimento congiunto delle rappresentanze per tabelle web, entità e tipi utilizzando Graph Convolutional Network', 'kk': 'Веб- кестелер, нысандар және түрлер үшін біріктіру', 'lt': 'Bendras žiniatinklių lentelių, subjektų ir tipų atstovybių mokymas naudojant grafikų konvoliucinį tinklą', 'mk': 'Заедничко учење на претставувања за веб- таблички, ентитети и типови користејќи графска конволуционална мрежа', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'Name', 'mt': 'Joint Learning of Representations for Web-tables, Entities and Types using Graph Convolutional Network', 'no': 'Joint Learning of Representations for Web-tables, Entities and Types using Graph Convolutional Network', 'mn': 'График Конvolutional Network ашигладаг Веб-хүснэгт, Entities болон Түрүүдийн төлөвлөлтийн нэгдсэн суралцах', 'pl': 'Wspólne uczenie się reprezentacji tabeli internetowych, podmiotów i typów przy użyciu sieci konwolucyjnej wykresu', 'ro': 'Învățarea comună a reprezentărilor pentru tabele web, entități și tipuri utilizând Rețeaua Convoluțională Graph', 'sr': 'Zajedničko učenje predstavljanja za web tablice, podaci i tipove koristeći konvolucionalnu mrežu grafika', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Gemensamt lärande av representationer för webbtabeller, enheter och typer med hjälp av Graph Convolutional Network', 'so': 'Joint Learning of Representations for Web tables, Entities and Types using Graph Convolution Network', 'ta': 'இணைய அட்டவணைகள், உள்ளீடுகள் மற்றும் வகைகளுக்கான மாற்றுதல்களை இணைப்பு கற்றுக் கொள்ளுங்கள்', 'ur': 'ویب-ٹیبلز، ایٹینٹیز اور ٹائیپ کے لئے نمایش کی تعلیم کے ساتھ ملے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Họp giáo dục tại nhiều nơi Mạng, các đơn vị và dạng dùng mạng lưới hình thức', 'bg': 'Съвместно обучение на представителства за уеб таблици, субекти и типове с помощта на графична конвелуционна мрежа', 'nl': 'Gezamenlijk leren van representaties voor web-tabellen, entiteiten en typen met behulp van Graph Convolutional Network', 'hr': 'Zajedničko učenje predstavljanja za web tablice, područja i vrste koristeći konvolucionalnu mrežu grafika', 'de': 'Gemeinsames Lernen von Repräsentationen für Web-Tabellen, Entitäten und Typen mittels Graph Convolutional Network', 'ko': '그림 볼륨 네트워크 기반의 웹 테이블, 실체와 유형 표시의 연합 학습', 'id': 'Pembelajaran Perkongsian Perwakilan untuk meja-web, Entitas dan Jenis menggunakan Jaringan Graph Convolutional', 'fa': 'همراه یادگیری از نمایش\u200cکنندگان برای میز\u200cهای وب، اجتماعات و نوع\u200cها با استفاده از شبکه\u200cهای گراف\u200c', 'da': 'Fælles læring af repræsentationer for webtabeller, enheder og typer ved hjælp af Graph Convolutional Network', 'sw': 'Kufundisha Mazungumzo kwa ajili ya meza za mtandaoni, Hifadhi na aina zote kwa kutumia Mtandao wa Kujitoleza Graph', 'tr': 'Web-täbler, ýerler we Taýplar üçin Mazmunlar öwrenmegi Goşulýa', 'sq': 'Mësimi i përbashkët i përfaqësimeve për tabelat web, njësitë dhe llojet duke përdorur rrjetin konvolutiv grafik', 'af': 'Soektog leer van voorstellings vir webtabelle, eenhede en tipes wat Grafiek Konvolusionele Netwerk gebruik word', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Web tables, entities and types using Graph Convolutional Network', 'bn': 'ওয়েব টেবিল, এন্টিটি এবং ধরনের প্রতিনিধি শিক্ষা যুক্ত করুন গ্রাফ কনভোলিয়েশন নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে', 'bs': 'Zajedničko učenje predstavljanja za web-tablete, entiteta i tipove koristeći konvolucionalnu mrežu grafika', 'cs': 'Společné učení reprezentací webových tabulek, entit a typů pomocí grafové konveluční sítě', 'ca': 'Aprendiment conjunt de representacions per taules web, entitats i tipus que utilitzen la xarxa de grafics convolucionants', 'hy': 'Վեբ-աղյուսակների, առանձնավորությունների և տեսակների ներկայացումների միասին սովորելը Graf', 'fi': 'Web-taulukoiden, entiteettien ja tyyppien edustustojen yhteinen oppiminen Graph Convolutional Network -verkostolla', 'et': 'Veebitabelite, üksuste ja tüüpide esinduste ühine õppimine Graphi konvolutsioonivõrgu abil', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'למידה משותפת של מייצגים לשולחנות, יחידות וסוגים באמצעות רשת שינוי גרפים', 'jv': 'Joint Learning of representations for web-table, Entients and Types use Graph convolution Network', 'sk': 'Skupno učenje predstavništev za spletne tabele, subjekte in vrste z uporabo konvolucionalnega omrežja Graph', 'bo': 'Joint Learning of Representations for Web-tables, Entities and Types using Graph Convolutional Network'}
{'en': 'Existing approaches for table annotation with entities and types either capture the structure of table using graphical models, or learn embeddings of table entries without accounting for the complete syntactic structure. We propose TabGCN, that uses Graph Convolutional Networks to capture the complete structure of tables, knowledge graph and the training annotations, and jointly learns embeddings for table elements as well as the entities and types. To account for knowledge incompleteness, TabGCN’s embeddings can be used to discover new entities and types. Using experiments on 5 benchmark datasets, we show that TabGCN significantly outperforms multiple state-of-the-art baselines for table annotation, while showing promising performance on downstream table-related applications.', 'ar': 'الأساليب الحالية للتعليق التوضيحي للجدول مع الكيانات والأنواع إما أن تلتقط بنية الجدول باستخدام نماذج رسومية ، أو تتعلم تضمين إدخالات الجدول دون احتساب البنية النحوية الكاملة. نقترح TabGCN ، التي تستخدم الشبكات التلافيفية للرسم البياني لالتقاط الهيكل الكامل للجداول ، والرسم البياني المعرفي ، وشروح التدريب ، وتتعلم بشكل مشترك حفلات الزفاف لعناصر الجدول وكذلك الكيانات والأنواع. لحساب عدم اكتمال المعرفة ، يمكن استخدام زينة TabGCN لاكتشاف كيانات وأنواع جديدة. باستخدام التجارب على 5 مجموعات بيانات معيارية ، نظهر أن TabGCN يتفوق بشكل كبير على خطوط الأساس المتعددة الحديثة للتعليق التوضيحي للجدول ، بينما يُظهر أداءً واعدًا في التطبيقات ذات الصلة بالجدول النهائية.', 'fr': "Les approches existantes pour l'annotation de table avec des entités et des types capturent la structure d'un tableau à l'aide de modèles graphiques ou apprennent à intégrer des entrées de table sans tenir compte de la structure syntaxique complète. Nous proposons TabGCN, qui utilise les réseaux convolutionnels de graphes pour capturer la structure complète des tableaux, le graphe de connaissances et les annotations d'apprentissage, et apprend conjointement les intégrations pour les éléments de table ainsi que les entités et les types. Pour tenir compte de l'incomplétude des connaissances, les intégrations de TabGCN peuvent être utilisées pour découvrir de nouvelles entités et de nouveaux types. À l'aide d'expériences sur 5 jeux de données de référence, nous montrons que TabGCN surpasse de manière significative plusieurs lignes de base de pointe pour l'annotation de tables, tout en affichant des performances prometteuses sur les applications liées aux tables en aval.", 'pt': 'As abordagens existentes para anotação de tabela com entidades e tipos capturam a estrutura da tabela usando modelos gráficos ou aprendem incorporações de entradas de tabela sem levar em conta a estrutura sintática completa. Propomos o TabGCN, que usa Graph Convolutional Networks para capturar a estrutura completa das tabelas, o Knowledge Graph e as anotações de treinamento, e aprende conjuntamente os embeddings dos elementos da tabela, bem como as entidades e tipos. Para explicar a incompletude do conhecimento, os embeddings do TabGCN podem ser usados para descobrir novas entidades e tipos. Usando experimentos em 5 conjuntos de dados de referência, mostramos que o TabGCN supera significativamente várias linhas de base de última geração para anotação de tabela, ao mesmo tempo em que mostra um desempenho promissor em aplicativos relacionados a tabelas downstream.', 'es': 'Los enfoques existentes para la anotación de tablas con entidades y tipos capturan la estructura de la tabla mediante modelos gráficos o aprenden la incrustación de entradas de tabla sin tener en cuenta la estructura sintáctica completa. Proponemos TabGCN, que utiliza Graph Convolutional Networks para capturar la estructura completa de las tablas, el gráfico de conocimiento y las anotaciones de capacitación, y aprende conjuntamente las incrustaciones para los elementos de la tabla, así como las entidades y los tipos. Para dar cuenta de la falta de integridad del conocimiento, las incorporaciones de TabGCN se pueden utilizar para descubrir nuevas entidades y tipos. Mediante el uso de experimentos en 5 conjuntos de datos de referencia, mostramos que TabGCN supera significativamente a múltiples líneas de base de última generación para la anotación de tablas, al tiempo que muestra un rendimiento prometedor en aplicaciones posteriores relacionadas con tablas.', 'ja': 'エンティティとタイプを持つテーブルアノテーションの既存のアプローチは、グラフィカルモデルを使用してテーブルの構造をキャプチャするか、完全な構文構造を考慮せずにテーブルエントリの埋め込みを学習します。グラフ畳み込みネットワークを使用して表、ナレッジグラフ、およびトレーニング注釈の完全な構造をキャプチャし、表要素の埋め込みとエンティティとタイプを共同で学習するTabGCNを提案します。知識の不完全さを説明するために、TabGCNの埋め込みを使用して、新しいエンティティとタイプを発見することができます。5つのベンチマークデータセットの実験を使用して、TabGCNは、テーブルアノテーションのための複数の最先端のベースラインを大幅に上回る一方で、ダウンストリームのテーブル関連アプリケーションで有望なパフォーマンスを示していることを示します。', 'hi': 'संस्थाओं और प्रकारों के साथ तालिका एनोटेशन के लिए मौजूदा दृष्टिकोण या तो ग्राफिकल मॉडल का उपयोग करके तालिका की संरचना को कैप्चर करते हैं, या पूर्ण वाक्यात्मक संरचना के लिए लेखांकन के बिना तालिका प्रविष्टियों के एम्बेडिंग सीखते हैं। हम TabGCN का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो तालिकाओं, ज्ञान ग्राफ और प्रशिक्षण एनोटेशन की पूरी संरचना को कैप्चर करने के लिए ग्राफ कनवल्शनल नेटवर्क का उपयोग करता है, और संयुक्त रूप से तालिका तत्वों के साथ-साथ संस्थाओं और प्रकारों के लिए एम्बेडिंग सीखता है। ज्ञान अपूर्णता के लिए खाते के लिए, TabGCN के एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग नई संस्थाओं और प्रकारों की खोज के लिए किया जा सकता है। 5 बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों का उपयोग करते हुए, हम दिखाते हैं कि TabGCN तालिका एनोटेशन के लिए कई अत्याधुनिक आधार रेखाओं को काफी हद तक बेहतर बनाता है, जबकि डाउनस्ट्रीम टेबल से संबंधित अनुप्रयोगों पर आशाजनक प्रदर्शन दिखाता है।', 'ru': 'Существующие подходы к аннотированию таблиц с сущностями и типами либо захватывают структуру таблицы с помощью графических моделей, либо изучают вложения элементов таблицы без учета полной синтаксической структуры. Мы предлагаем TabGCN, который использует Graph Convolutional Networks для захвата полной структуры таблиц, графа знаний и обучающих аннотаций, а также совместно изучает вложения для элементов таблицы, а также сущностей и типов. Чтобы учесть неполноту знаний, вложения TabGCN могут быть использованы для обнаружения новых сущностей и типов. Используя эксперименты на 5 эталонных наборах данных, мы показываем, что TabGCN значительно превосходит несколько современных базовых линий для аннотирования таблиц, показывая при этом многообещающую производительность в приложениях, связанных с последующими таблицами.', 'zh': '用实体与形表批注者有法乎?用图形而得表者,有学表条而不虑全者语法。 臣等建TabGCN,用图卷积网络以获表,图谱训注完结,并学习表元素及实体之类。 为说知不完整性,TabGCN嵌见新体。 用对5基准数据集的实验,我们看见TabGCN在表注方面显优于多最先进的基线,并且在下流表相关应用程序上显示有希望的性能。', 'ga': 'Gabhann cineálacha cur chuige reatha maidir le anótáil táblaí le haonáin agus cineálacha struchtúr an tábla ag baint úsáide as samhlacha grafacha, nó foghlaimíonn siad leabaithe iontrálacha tábla gan cuntas a thabhairt ar an struchtúr comhréire iomlán. Molaimid TabGCN, a úsáideann Líonraí Comhdhlúite Graf chun struchtúr iomlán na dtáblaí, an ghraf eolais agus na nótaí oiliúna a ghabháil, agus a fhoghlaimíonn i gcomhpháirt leabaithe d’eilimintí boird chomh maith leis na haonáin agus na cineálacha. Chun neamhiomlán an eolais a chur san áireamh, is féidir leabaithe TabGCN a úsáid chun aonáin agus cineálacha nua a aimsiú. Trí úsáid a bhaint as turgnaimh ar 5 thacar sonraí tagarmhairc, léirímid go sáraíonn TabGCN go suntasach bonnlínte iolracha úrscothacha le haghaidh nótaí táblaí, agus ag an am céanna léiriú ar fheidhmíocht dhearfach ar fheidhmchláir iartheachtacha a bhaineann le táblaí.', 'el': 'Οι υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις για την επισήμανση πίνακα με οντότητες και τύπους είτε συλλαμβάνουν τη δομή του πίνακα χρησιμοποιώντας γραφικά μοντέλα, είτε μαθαίνουν ενσωμάτωση καταχωρήσεων πίνακα χωρίς να υπολογίζουν την πλήρη συντακτική δομή. Προτείνουμε το το οποίο χρησιμοποιεί τα Δίκτυα Σύγκλισης Γραφημάτων για να καταγράψει την πλήρη δομή των πινάκων, του γραφήματος γνώσης και των σχολίων εκπαίδευσης, και από κοινού μαθαίνει ενσωματώσεις για στοιχεία πίνακα καθώς και για τις οντότητες και τους τύπους. Για να υπολογίσετε την ελλιπότητα της γνώσης, οι ενσωματώσεις του μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν για την ανακάλυψη νέων οντοτήτων και τύπων. Χρησιμοποιώντας πειράματα σε 5 σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς, δείχνουμε ότι το TabGCN ξεπερνά σημαντικά τις πολλαπλές γραμμές βάσης για σχολιασμό πίνακα, ενώ δείχνει ελπιδοφόρα απόδοση σε μεταγενέστερες εφαρμογές που σχετίζονται με πίνακες.', 'hu': 'Az entitásokkal és típusokkal történő táblázatjegyzetek meglévő megközelítései vagy grafikus modellek segítségével rögzítik a táblázat szerkezetét, vagy megtanulják a táblázatbejegyzések beágyazását anélkül, hogy a teljes szintaktikus struktúrát figyelembe vennék. Javasoljuk a TabGCN-t, amely a Graph Convolucional Networks segítségével rögzíti a táblázatok, a tudásgraf és a képzési jegyzetek teljes struktúráját, és közösen megtanulja a táblázatelemek, valamint az entitások és típusok beágyazását. A tudás hiányosságának figyelembevétele érdekében a TabGCN beágyazásai új entitások és típusok felfedezésére használhatók. 5 benchmark adatkészleten végzett kísérletek segítségével megmutatjuk, hogy a TabGCN jelentősen felülmúlja a táblázatjegyzetek több korszerű alapvonalát, miközben ígéretes teljesítményt mutat a downstream táblázathoz kapcsolódó alkalmazásokon.', 'ka': 'თენტიტებით და ტიპებისთვის ცხრილის ანოტაციებისთვის მიმდინარე დახმარება თუ გრაფიკალური მოდელებისთვის გამოყენებული ცხრილის სტრუქტურაციას, ან შესწავლობა ცხრილის ანოტაცი ჩვენ ვაპირებთ TabGCN-ს, რომელიც გამოყენებს გრაფიკური ქსელემენტების საკუთარ სტრუქტურაციას, ცნობიერების გრაფიკური და განსწავლების ამოცანების სტრუქტურაციას, და ერთადერთად ვისწავლეთ ინტე ცნობიერების უკეთესობის შესახებ, TabGCN-ის შესახებ შეიძლება ახალი ინტერტიების და ტიპების განახლებისთვის გამოყენება. 5 ბანქმერის მონაცემების ექსპერიმენტების გამოყენება, ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ TabGCN მნიშვნელოვანად უფრო გავაკეთებს მრავალური მონაცემებისთვის განსაზღვრებული მხარდაჭერების განსაზღვრე', 'it': "Gli approcci esistenti per l'annotazione di tabelle con entità e tipi catturano la struttura della tabella utilizzando modelli grafici o imparano le incorporazioni di voci di tabella senza tenere conto della struttura sintattica completa. Proponiamo TabGCN, che utilizza Graph Convolutional Networks per catturare la struttura completa delle tabelle, del grafico della conoscenza e delle annotazioni di formazione, e impara congiuntamente le incorporazioni per gli elementi della tabella così come le entità e i tipi. Per rendere conto dell'incompletezza delle conoscenze, le incorporazioni di TabGCN possono essere utilizzate per scoprire nuove entità e tipi. Utilizzando esperimenti su 5 set di dati benchmark, mostriamo che TabGCN supera significativamente più linee di base all'avanguardia per l'annotazione delle tabelle, mostrando prestazioni promettenti sulle applicazioni relative alle tabelle a valle.", 'lt': 'Esami metodai lentelės annotacijai su subjektais ir tipais arba apibrėžia lentelės struktūrą naudojant grafinius modelius, arba išmoko įtraukti lentelės įrašus neatskaitant visos sintaksinės struktūros. Mes siūlome TabGCN, kuris naudoja grafinius konvoliucinius tinklus, kad būtų galima surinkti visą lentelių struktūrą, žinių grafiką ir mokymo anotacijas, ir bendrai išmoko įtraukti lentelių elementus, taip pat subjektus ir tipus. Atsižvelgiant į žinių neišsamumą, TabGCN įdėjiniai gali būti naudojami naujiems subjektams ir tipams nustatyti. Naudodami 5 lyginamųjų duomenų rinkinių eksperimentus, parodome, kad TabGCN gerokai viršija keletą naujausių bazinių linijų lentelės anotacijoms, tačiau rodo perspektyvius rezultatus su tolesnėmis lentelėmis susijusiose programose.', 'kk': 'Нәтижелер мен түрлермен кесте жазбаларының барлық арқылы графикалық үлгілерімен кестенің құрылымын түсіріп, немесе толық синтактикалық құрылымын есептеп кесте жазуларының ендіруді үйрену. Кестелер, білім графикалық графикалық жұмыстардың толық құрылымын, оқу графикасын және оқу белгілерін түсіру үшін графикалық жұмыстарды қолданып, кесте элементтеріне және бағдарламаларды және түрлеріне ендіру Білім толық емес деген тіркелгі үшін, Tab GCN- нің ендірімі жаңа нысандар мен түрлерді табу үшін қолданылады. 5 бағдарламалар деректер қорларында тәжірибелер қолданылатын, TabGCN кесте жазбаларының бірнеше күй- жазбаларының негізгі сызықтарын көрсетеді. Бірақ кестелердің бағдарламаларының бағдарламаларын көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Постојаните пристапи за анатација на масата со ентитети и типови или ја фаќаат структурата на масата користејќи графички модели, или научуваат вложувања на табелни записи без сметководство за целосната синтактичка структура. Ние предложуваме TabGCN, која користи графички конволуционални мрежи за да ја фати целосната структура на таблички, знаење график и обуки, и заедно учи вградувања за таблички елементи, како и ентитетите и типовите. За да се одговори за недовршеноста на знаењето, вградувањата на TabGCN може да се користат за откривање на нови ентитети и типови. Користејќи експерименти на 5 набори на податоци за benchmark, покажуваме дека TabGCN значително ги надминува повеќето најсовремени основни линии за анатација на масата, при што покажува ветувачки резултати на понатамошните апликации поврзани со масата.', 'ms': 'pendekatan yang wujud untuk anotasi jadual dengan entiti dan jenis sama ada menangkap struktur jadual menggunakan model grafik, atau belajar pelengkapan masukan jadual tanpa akaun untuk struktur sintaktik lengkap. Kami mencadangkan TabGCN, yang menggunakan Rangkaian Graf Konveolutional untuk menangkap struktur lengkap jadual, graf pengetahuan dan anotasi latihan, dan bersama-sama belajar pelengkapan untuk unsur jadual serta entiti dan jenis. Untuk menganggap pengetahuan tidak lengkap, bentuk TabGCN boleh digunakan untuk mencari entiti dan jenis baru. Menggunakan eksperimen pada set data 5 tanda referensi, kami menunjukkan bahawa TabGCN jauh melebihi baris dasar berbilang keadaan-terakhir untuk anotasi jadual, sementara menunjukkan prestasi yang berjanji pada aplikasi berkaitan dengan jadual turun.', 'mt': 'Existing approaches for table annotation with entities and types either capture the structure of table using graphical models, or learn embeddings of table entries without accounting for the complete syntactic structure.  Aħna nipproponu t-TabGCN, li tuża n-Netwerks ta’ Konvenzjoni tal-Grafika biex tinqabad l-istruttura sħiħa tat-tabelli, il-graff tal-għarfien u l-annotazzjonijiet tat-taħriġ, u jitgħallem b’mod konġunt l-inkorporazzjonijiet għall-elementi tat-tabella kif ukoll l-entitajiet u t-tipi. Biex jiġi kkunsidrat l-inkompleta tal-għarfien, l-inkorporazzjonijiet tat-TabGCN jistgħu jintużaw biex jiġu skoperti entitajiet u tipi ġodda. Bl-użu ta’ esperimenti fuq ħames settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ parametri referenzjarji, nagħmlu evidenza li t-TabGCN taqbeż b’mod sinifikanti diversi linji ta’ bażi l-aktar avvanzati għall-annotazzjoni tat-tabella, filwaqt li turi prestazzjoni promettenti fuq applikazzjonijiet downstream relatati mat-tabella.', 'mn': 'Үснэгт болон төрлийн хүснэгтийн загварыг график загвараар ашиглан хүснэгтийн загварын загварыг барьж, эсвэл бүрэн синтактик бүтцийг тооцоогүй хүснэгтийн загварын загварыг сурах арга барилга юм. Бид хүснэгт, мэдлэг график, сургалтын жагсаалт, хүснэгт элементүүд болон төрлийн төрлийн бүтэц бүтэц бүтээгдэхүүнийг ашиглаж, хүснэгт элементүүд болон бүтээгдэхүүнийг хамтдаа сурдаг TabGCN-г санал болгож байна. Мэдлэгийг төгс байдлын төлөө тооцоолохын тулд, TabGCN-ын нэвтрүүлэлтийг шинэ бүтээлүүд болон төрлүүд олж мэдэхэд ашиглаж болно. 5 салбарын өгөгдлийн сан дээр туршилтуудыг ашиглаж, TabGCN нь хүснэгт хамааралтай програм дээр амлалтай үйл ажиллагааг харуулж байгааг харуулж байна.', 'ml': 'വസ്തുക്കളുടെയും ടൈപ്പുകളുടെയും ടേബിളിന്റെയും അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിനുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d ഗ്രാഫിക്കല്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് പിടിക്കുക, അല്ലെങ്ക ടാബ്ജിജിസിനെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഗ്രാഫ് കോണ്\u200dവിളേഷന്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ടേബിളുകളുടെ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ സ്ഥാനം, അറിവ് ഗ്രാ പരിജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായതിനായി കണക്കാക്കാന്\u200d, ടാബിജിസിന്\u200dറെ അകത്തുള്ള പുതിയ വസ്തുക്കളും ടൈപ്പുകളും കണ്ട 5 ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡേറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ടാബിജിസിനെ കാണിക്കുന്നത് ടേബിളിന്\u200dറെ അഭിപ്രായം കാണിക്കുന്നതിനായി പല സ്ഥാ', 'no': 'Existende tilnærmingar for tabellnotasjon med einingar og typar kan anten henta strukturen av tabellen med grafiske modeller, eller læra innbygging av tabelloppføringar utan å rekna på fullstendig syntaksisk struktur. Vi foreslår tabGCN, som brukar grafikkkonvolusjonelle nettverk for å henta fullstendig struktur av tabeller, kunnskapsgrafen og opplæringsnotasjonane, og lærer innbygging for tabellelementer og einingar og typar. For å rekna om kunnskap ikkje fullstendig, kan tabGCN- innbygginga brukast for å oppdaga nye einingar og typar. Bruk eksperimenter på 5 benchmarkdatasett viser vi at tabGCN utfører fleire kunstbaselinjer for tabellannotasjonar, mens det viser promiserende utviklingar på nedstraumtabellrelaterte program.', 'ro': 'Abordările existente pentru adnotarea tabelului cu entități și tipuri fie capturează structura tabelului utilizând modele grafice, fie învăță încorporarea intrărilor de tabel fără a ține cont de structura sintactică completă. Propunem TabGCN, care utilizează Graph Convolutional Networks pentru a capta structura completă a tabelelor, graficului cunoștințelor și adnotărilor de instruire, și învață împreună încorporarea elementelor de tabel, precum și a entităților și tipurilor. Pentru a explica incompletitatea cunoștințelor, încorporările TabGCN pot fi folosite pentru a descoperi noi entități și tipuri. Folosind experimente pe 5 seturi de date de referință, arătăm că TabGCN depășește în mod semnificativ mai multe linii de referință de ultimă generație pentru adnotarea tabelului, prezentând în același timp performanțe promițătoare pentru aplicațiile legate de tabel din aval.', 'pl': 'Istniejące podejścia do adnotacji tabeli z podmiotami i typami albo przechwytują strukturę tabeli za pomocą modeli graficznych, albo uczą się osadzeń wpisów tabeli bez uwzględniania pełnej struktury składni. Proponujemy TabGCN, który wykorzystuje sieci konwolucyjne Graph do przechwytywania pełnej struktury tabel, wykresu wiedzy i adnotacji szkoleniowych, a także wspólnie uczy się osadzeń dla elementów tabeli oraz podmiotów i typów. Aby uwzględnić niekompletność wiedzy, osadzenia TabGCN mogą być wykorzystane do odkrywania nowych podmiotów i typów. Korzystając z eksperymentów na 5-ciu zestawach danych referencyjnych, pokazujemy, że TabGCN znacznie przewyższa wiele najnowocześniejszych linii bazowych dla adnotacji tabeli, jednocześnie pokazując obiecującą wydajność w aplikacjach związanych z tabelami.', 'so': 'Dhaqdhaqaaqa tababarka ku qoran ee macluumaadka iyo noocyada miiska ku qoran ama ku qabsada dhismaha sawiraadka, ama ku barta meelaha lagu soo galo miiska iyadoon xisaab ku lahayn dhismaha kaamilka ah oo dhan. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa TabGCN, kaasoo isticmaalaya shabakadda iskuulka ah ee Graf ku saabsan si aan u qabsado dhamaan dhismaha looxyada, sawirka aqoonta iyo tababarka waxbarashada, wuxuuna si wadajir ah u baranayaa meelaha lagu qorayo miiska iyo waxyaabaha iyo noocyada. Si loo xisaabo dhamaaneynta aqoonta waxaa loo isticmaali karaa macluumaad cusub iyo noocyo cusub. Sida lagu isticmaalayo imtixaamo ku saabsan 5 benchmark databases, waxaynu tusnaynaa in TabGCN aad u muuqata qoraal-qori-ka-art ah oo uu ka muujiyo tababarida la xiriira tababarka hoose-miiska.', 'sv': 'Befintliga metoder för tabellanteckningar med entiteter och typer fångar antingen tabellstrukturen med hjälp av grafiska modeller eller lär sig inbäddningar av tabellposter utan att ta hänsyn till den fullständiga syntaktiska strukturen. Vi föreslår TabGCN, som använder Graph Convolutional Networks för att fånga hela strukturen av tabeller, kunskapsdiagram och utbildningsanteckningar, och gemensamt lär sig inbäddningar för tabellelement samt entiteter och typer. För att ta hänsyn till kunskapsofullständighet kan TabGCN:s inbäddningar användas för att upptäcka nya entiteter och typer. Med hjälp av experiment på 5 benchmarkdatauppsättningar visar vi att TabGCN avsevärt överträffar flera toppmoderna baslinjer för tabellnotering, samtidigt som vi visar lovande prestanda på efterföljande tabellrelaterade applikationer.', 'si': 'මුළුවන් සහ වර්ගය සඳහා පැත්තක් නිර්මාණය සඳහා පැත්තක් නිර්මාණය සඳහා පැත්තක් නිර්මාණය සඳහා පැත්තක් නිර්මාණය සඳහා පැත්තක අපි ටැබ්ජික්න් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා, ඒක ග්\u200dරාෆ් සංවිධානය ජාලය භාවිත කරනවා මේස්, දැනගැනීම ග්\u200dරාෆ් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ම දන්නවක් නැති අවස්ථාවක් ගැන ගිණුම් කරන්න, ටැබ්ජික්න් ගේ සංවිධානය අළුත් අයිති වර්ගය හා වර්ගය හ බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සේට් 5 වල ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ටැබ්ජික් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් විදිහට ප', 'sr': 'Postoje pristupi za tablovu annotaciju sa entitetima i tipovima ili uhvate strukturu stola koristeći grafičke modele, ili naučite integraciju tablovih ulaza bez računovođenja za kompletnu sintaktičku strukturu. Predlažemo TabGCN, koji koristi konvolucionalne mreže grafika kako bi uhvatili kompletnu strukturu stolova, grafika znanja i annotacije obuke i zajedno naučili integraciju za elemente stola, kao i entitate i tipove. Da bi se računalo o nepotpunosti znanja, TabGCN se uključuje za otkrivanje novih entiteta i tipa. Koristeći eksperimente na 5 standardnih seta podataka, pokazujemo da TabGCN značajno iznosi više stanja umjetničkih osnovnih linija za annotaciju stola, dok pokazujemo obećavajuću predstavu na aplikaciji povezanih sa nizstranim tablom.', 'ta': 'முழு ஒத்திசைவு அமைப்புக்கு கணக்கிடாமல் அட்டவணை பொருள் மற்றும் வகைகளுடன் கொண்டு அட்டவணை அறிவிப்புக்கு தற்போதைய நெருங்குகள் இருக்கிறது. முழு அட்டவணைகள், அறிவு வரைபடம் மற்றும் பயிற்சி குறிப்புகளை பிடிக்கும் முழுமையான அட்டவணைகள் மற்றும் அட்டவணை உறுப்புகள் மற்றும் பொருள் மற்றும் வகைகளுக்க அறிவின் முழுமையான எண்ணிக்கைக்கு, அட்டவணையின் உள்ளடக்கங்கள் புதிய பொருள்கள் மற்றும் வகைகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க பயன்படுத 5 பெங்க்மார்க் தரவுத்தளத்தில் சோதனைகளை பயன்படுத்தி, தத்தல் குறிப்பிடும் அட்டவணை அறிவிப்பிற்கான பல நிலையில் இருந்து தொடர்பு அட்டவணை தொடர்புடைய பயன்ப', 'ur': 'ابتداء اور تایپ کے ساتھ ٹیبل انٹرنیٹ کے لئے موجود طریقے ہیں یا گرافیک موڈل کے مطابق ٹیبل کی ساختار کو پکڑتے ہیں یا تایبل انٹرنیٹ کی انٹرنیٹ کی انٹرنیٹ کی انٹرنیٹ کی انٹرنیٹ کی انٹرنیٹ ہم TabGCN کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، جو ٹیبل، علم گراف اور ترینسی نوٹیزوں کے کامل ساختار کو پکڑنے کے لئے گراف کنویروشن نیٹورک کا استعمال کرتا ہے، اور ٹیبل عنصروں کے لئے ایک ساتھ ایمبڈینگ سکھاتا ہے، اور عنصروں اور طریقوں کے لئے۔ علم غیر پوری کے لئے، TabGCN کے انڈینگ کو نو ایٹینٹ اور ٹیپ پیدا کرنے کے لئے استعمال کر سکتے ہیں. 5 بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ پر آزمائش استعمال کرتے ہیں، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ TabGCN ٹیبل انٹیٹ کے لئے بہت سی ایٹ آرت بنسٹ لینوں کو زیادہ زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے، حالانکہ ڈونسٹریم ٹیبل کے ارتباط کے بارے میں وعدہ دینے', 'uz': "Name @ info Ogohlantirish muvaffaqiyatsiz tugadi uchun TabGCN embedlari yangi obʼektlarni va turlarini aniqlash uchun ishlatiladi. 5 benchmark maʼlumotlar bazasini ishlatishda, TabGCN tab taʼminlovchisi uchun bir nechta holatni bajariladi, va taʼminot taʼminlovchisi uchun bir nechta holatni ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Sự tồn tại các phương pháp ghi chú bảng với các thực thể và kiểu hoặc nắm bắt cấu trúc của bàn bằng các mô hình đồ họa, hoặc biết sự nhúng vào các mục bàn mà không tính toán về cấu trúc cú pháp toàn diện. Chúng tôi đề nghị TabGCN, người dùng mạng lưới hình sự có thể nắm bắt to àn bộ cấu trúc của bảng, đồ thị kiến thức và chú thích huấn luyện, và cùng học sự ghép nối cho các yếu tố bàn, các thực thể và các loại. Để tính đến s ự chưa hoàn thiện của kiến thức, sự gắn kết của TabGCN có thể được dùng để phát hiện các thực thể và loại mới. Bằng cách sử dụng các mẫu dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn 5, chúng tôi cho thấy rằng TabGCN khả năng cao hơn nhiều bản nền tối tân cho ghi chú bàn, trong khi hiển thị hiệu quả hứa hẹn trên các ứng dụng phụ thuộc bàn xuôi dòng.', 'hr': 'Postoje pristupi za tablovu annotaciju s entitetima i tipovima ili uhvatiti strukturu stola koristeći grafičke modele ili naučiti integraciju tablovih ulaza bez računovođenja za kompletnu sintaktičku strukturu. Predlažemo TabGCN, koji koristi konvolucionalne mreže grafika kako bi uhvatili kompletnu strukturu stolova, grafika znanja i annotacije obuke, te zajedno učili ugrađenje za elemente stolice, kao i entitete i tipove. Za obzir na nepotpunost znanja, TabGCN se uključuje za otkrivanje novih entitata i tipa. Koristeći eksperimente na pet standardnih podataka, pokazujemo da TabGCN značajno iznosi višestruke početne linije umjetnosti za annotaciju table, dok pokazujemo obećavajuću učinku na aplikaciji povezanih s nizom tablom.', 'nl': 'Bestaande benaderingen voor tabelnotatie met entiteiten en typen leggen ofwel de structuur van de tabel vast met behulp van grafische modellen, of leren insluitingen van tabelinstellingen zonder rekening te houden met de volledige syntactische structuur. We stellen TabGCN voor, dat gebruikmaakt van Graph Convolutional Networks om de volledige structuur van tabellen, kennisgrafieken en de trainingsannotaties vast te leggen, en gezamenlijk leert embeddings voor tabelelementen evenals de entiteiten en types. Om rekening te houden met onvolledigheid van kennis, kunnen de insluitingen van TabGCN worden gebruikt om nieuwe entiteiten en typen te ontdekken. Aan de hand van experimenten met 5-benchmarkdatasets laten we zien dat TabGCN aanzienlijk beter presteert dan meerdere state-of-the-art baselines voor tabelnotatie, terwijl het veelbelovende prestaties toont op downstream tabelgerelateerde toepassingen.', 'da': "Eksisterende tilgange til tabelnotering med entiteter og typer indfanger enten strukturen i tabellen ved hjælp af grafiske modeller eller lærer indlejringer af tabelposter uden at tage hensyn til den komplette syntaktiske struktur. Vi foreslår TabGCN, der bruger Graph Convolutional Networks til at indfange den komplette struktur af tabeller, viden graf og træning annotationer, og i fællesskab lærer indlejringer for tabelelementer samt enheder og typer. For at redegøre for ufuldstændighed af viden kan TabGCN's indlejringer bruges til at opdage nye enheder og typer. Ved hjælp af eksperimenter på 5 benchmark datasæt viser vi, at TabGCN betydeligt overgår flere state-of-the-art basislinjer for tabel annotation, samtidig med at vi viser lovende ydeevne på downstream tabel-relaterede applikationer.", 'bg': 'Съществуващите подходи за анотация на таблици с обекти и типове или улавят структурата на таблицата с помощта на графични модели, или научават вграждания на записи в таблици, без да отчитат цялата синтактична структура. Предлагаме която използва Графични конвелуционни мрежи за улавяне на цялостната структура на таблиците, графиката на знанието и анотациите за обучение и съвместно научава вграждания за елементите на таблиците, както и същностите и типовете. За да се отчете непълността на знанията, вгражданията на могат да се използват за откриване на нови обекти и типове. Използвайки експерименти върху 5 базови набора данни, ние показваме, че значително превъзхожда множество най-съвременни базови линии за анотация на таблици, като същевременно показва обещаваща производителност при приложения, свързани с таблици надолу по веригата.', 'de': 'Bestehende Ansätze zur Tabellenannotation mit Entitäten und Typen erfassen entweder die Struktur der Tabelle mithilfe grafischer Modelle oder lernen Einbettungen von Tabelleneinträgen, ohne die komplette syntaktische Struktur zu berücksichtigen. Wir schlagen TabGCN vor, das Graph Convolutional Networks verwendet, um die komplette Struktur von Tabellen, Wissensgraphen und Trainingsannotationen zu erfassen und gemeinsam Einbettungen für Tabellenelemente sowie die Entitäten und Typen zu erlernen. Um Unvollständigkeiten des Wissens Rechnung zu tragen, können die Einbettungen von TabGCN verwendet werden, um neue Entitäten und Typen zu entdecken. Anhand von Experimenten an 5-Benchmark-Datensätzen zeigen wir, dass TabGCN mehrere State-of-the-Art-Baselines für Tabellenannotation deutlich übertrifft und gleichzeitig eine vielversprechende Leistung für nachgelagerte tabellenbezogene Anwendungen zeigt.', 'ko': '기존의 실체와 유형표 주석 방법은 도형 모델로 표의 구조를 포획하거나 표 항목의 삽입을 배우거나 완전한 문법 구조를 고려하지 않는다.우리는 TabGCN을 제기했는데 이것은 도권적 네트워크를 이용하여 표, 지식도와 훈련 주석의 완전한 구조를 포획하고 학습표 요소와 실체와 유형의 삽입을 결합시킨다.지식의 불완전성을 설명하기 위해 TabGCN의 삽입을 사용하여 새로운 실체와 유형을 발견할 수 있습니다.5개의 기준 데이터 집합에서의 실험을 통해 우리는 TabGCN이 표 주석 방면에서 여러 개의 가장 선진적인 기선보다 현저히 우수하고 하류와 표 관련 응용 프로그램에서 좋은 성능을 나타내는 것을 발견했다.', 'id': 'pendekatan yang ada untuk anotasi tabel dengan entitas dan tipe sama ada menangkap struktur tabel menggunakan model grafis, atau belajar embedding entri tabel tanpa memperhitungkan struktur sintaksi lengkap. Kami mengusulkan TabGCN, yang menggunakan Graph Convolutional Networks untuk menangkap struktur lengkap tabel, grafik pengetahuan dan anotasi pelatihan, dan bersama-sama belajar embedding untuk elemen tabel serta entitas dan tipe. Untuk memperhitungkan ketidaklengkap pengetahuan, penerbangan TabGCN dapat digunakan untuk menemukan entitas dan tipe baru. Menggunakan eksperimen pada 5 set data benchmark, kami menunjukkan bahwa TabGCN jauh lebih berharga dari berbagai baris dasar state-of-the-art untuk anotasi meja, sementara menunjukkan prestasi yang berjanji pada aplikasi terkait meja turun.', 'sw': 'Matokeo yanayopo kwa ajili ya mabango yanayohusiana na vitu na aina mbalimbali au kuangalia muundo wa meza kwa kutumia mifano ya picha, au kujifunza viungo vya meza bila kuhesabu muundo kamili wa ushirikiano. Tunawapendekeza TabGCN, ambayo hutumia Mtandao wa Uchaguzi wa Graph kuikamata miundombi kamili ya meza, maarifa ya ufahamu na matangazo ya mafunzo, na kwa pamoja inajifunza vifaa vya mezani pamoja na vitu na aina. Kuhusu ukosefu wa ufahamu, viungo vya TabGCN vinaweza kutumika kutambua vitu vipya na aina mpya. Kwa kutumia majaribio kwenye seti za taarifa za benchmark 5, tunaonyesha kwamba TabGCN inafanya vizuri zaidi misingi mbalimbali ya hali ya sanaa kwa ajili ya matangazo ya tabaka, wakati wakionyesha matumizi ya kuahidini kwenye matumizi yanayohusiana na mitandao ya chini ya mto.', 'tr': "Barlyklar we hiller bilen täblisaň sözleşmeleri üçin bar ýaryşylar grafik modellerniň ullanyp täblisaň girişini öwreni, ýada bütün sintaktik strukturyň içine girişini öwreni. Biz TabGCN'i, tabularyň, bilim grafynyň we aýdymlaryň doly strukturyny almak üçin grafik boýunça netijesini ulanan çyzgymlary teklip edip, täblisaň elementleri we milletler we hileleri üçin birleşik öwrenip otyrýarys. Bilim ýetersizligi üçin esap etmek üçin, täze hiller we hiller tapmak üçin tabGCN ködlemeleri ullanylar. 5 benchmark veri setirlerinde deneyler ullanýarys, tabGCN täblisaň barada sowlamak üçin birnäçe möhüm durumlarnyň üstüne çykarýandygyny görkez.", 'af': 'Bestaande toegang vir tabel annotasie met entiteite en tipes of die struktuur van tabel met grafiese modelle te vang, of leer inbêring van tabel inskrywings sonder rekening vir die volledige sintakteel struktuur. Ons stel TabGCN voorstel, wat graf Konvolusionele Netwerke gebruik om die volledige struktuur van tabelle, kennis graaf en die opvoeringsnotasies te vang, en saamstig leer inbettings vir tabelelemente en die entiteite en tipes. Om kennis onvolledig te reken, kan TabGCN se inbêding gebruik word om nuwe entiteite en tipes te ontdek. Deur te gebruik eksperimente op 5 benchmark datastelle, wys ons dat TabGCN betekenlik meerdere staat-van-die-kuns basisline vir tabel annotasie uitvoer, terwyl ons beloftende prestasie vertoon op onderstreem tabel verwante toepassings.', 'fa': 'موجود روش\u200cهایی برای نوشتن جدول با عناصر و نوع\u200cها یا ساختار میز را با استفاده از مدل\u200cهای گرافیکی بگیرند، یا یاد بگیرید که وارد\u200cهای میز بدون حساب برای ساختار ساختار کامل سنتاکتیک است. ما TabGCN را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که از شبکه\u200cهای مجموعه گراف استفاده می\u200cکند تا ساختار کامل میز، گراف دانش و یادآوری\u200cهای آموزش را بگیرد، و با همدیگر برای عناصر میز و عناصر و نوع\u200cهایی یاد می\u200cگیرد. برای حساب غیر کامل دانش، وسیله\u200cهای TabGCN می\u200cتوانند برای کشف شرکت\u200cهای جدید و نوع\u200cها استفاده می\u200cشوند. با استفاده از آزمایشات روی پایگاه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای سنگ\u200cمارک ۵، نشان می\u200cدهیم که TabGCN بسیار زیادی از خطوط\u200cهای بنیادی\u200cهای هنری برای نشان\u200cدهنده\u200cهای میز انجام می\u200cدهد، در حالی که نشان می\u200cدهیم عملکرد قول\u200cدهنده در کاربردهای مربوط به میز پای', 'hy': 'Գոյություն ունեցող մոտեցումները աղյուսակի annoտացիայի համար առանձնահատկություններով և տեսակներով կամ գրաֆիկական մոդելներով գրավում են աղյուսակի կառուցվածքը, կամ սովորում են աղյուսակի գրառումների ներառումներ առանց հաշվարկության ամբող Մենք առաջարկում ենք TabGNC-ը, որը օգտագործում է Graf հակադրական ցանցեր աղյուսակների ամբողջական կառուցվածքը, գիտելիքների գրաֆիկը և ուսումնասիրության նոտացիաները վերցնելու համար, և միասին սովորում է սեղանի տարրերի, ինչպես նաև առանձնահատկությունների և տեսակների ներգրավում Գիտության անլրիվ հաշվի առնելու համար TabGNC-ի ներդրումները կարող են օգտագործվել նոր էակներ և տեսակներ հայտնաբերելու համար: Օգտագործելով 5 համեմատային տվյալների համակարգերի փորձարկումներ, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ TabGNC-ը նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում է բազմաթիվ բարձր հիմնական գծեր աղյուսակի annoտացիայի համար, մինչդեռ ցույց է տալիս խոստացնող արդյունք աղյուսակի', 'sq': 'Përqasjet ekzistuese për anotacionin e tabelës me njësi dhe tipa ose kapin strukturën e tabelës duke përdorur modele grafike, ose mësojnë përfshirje të hyrjeve në tabelë pa llogaritur për strukturën e plotë sintaktike. Ne propozojmë TabGCN, që përdorë rrjetet e konvolutive grafike për të kapur strukturën e plotë të tabelave, grafikun e njohurive dhe anotacionet e stërvitjes dhe mëson së bashku përfshirje për elementet e tabelës si dhe njësitë dhe llojet. Për të marrë parasysh mosplotësinë e njohurive, përfshirjet e TabGCN mund të përdoren për të zbuluar njësi dhe lloje të reja. Duke përdorur eksperimente në 5 baza të dhënash, ne tregojmë se TabGCN ekziston në mënyrë të konsiderueshme më shumë linja bazë më të larta për anotacionin e tabelës, ndërsa tregon performancë premtuese në aplikimet më poshtë të lidhura me tabelën.', 'az': "Bütün sintaktik quruluş hesablamadan, çubuqlar və növləri ilə səhifə məlumatları və ya grafik modellərin vasitəsilə səhifə məlumatlarının qurulmasını öyrənir. TabGCN'i təklif edirik ki, tabelalar, elm grafının tamamlanması üçün Graph Convolutional Networks istifadə edir, həmçinin səhifələri və məktəblər və türlər üçün birlikdə səhifələri öyrənir. Bilim tamamlanmasını hesab etmək üçün TabGCN içərisində yeni məxluqat və növləri tapmaq üçün istifadə edilə bilər. 5 benchmark verilənlər qurularında eksperimentlərlə istifadə edirik ki, TabGCN tabeçi ilə bağlı proqramlar barəsində vəd verilən tədbirlərin çoxlu vəziyyətlərini göstərir.", 'bs': 'Postojeći pristupi za tablovu annotaciju sa entitetima i tipovima ili uhvatiti strukturu stola koristeći grafičke modele, ili naučiti integraciju tablovih ulaza bez računovođenja za kompletnu sintaktičku strukturu. Predlažemo TabGCN, koji koristi konvolucionalne mreže grafika kako bi uhvatili kompletnu strukturu stolova, grafika znanja i annotacije obuke, te zajedno učili integraciju za elemente stola, kao i entitete i tipove. Da bi se računalo o nepotpunosti znanja, TabGCN se uključuje za otkrivanje novih entitata i tipa. Koristeći eksperimente na pet standardnih podataka, pokazujemo da TabGCN značajno iznosi višestruke stanice umjetnosti za annotaciju table, dok pokazujemo obećavajuću učinku na aplikacijama povezanim s tablom.', 'bn': 'বস্তু এবং টাইপ ব্যবহার করে টেবিলের বিষয়বস্তুর ব্যাপারে বিদ্যমান ক্ষেত্রে বিদ্যমান ক্ষেত্রে বিদ্যমান ক্ষেত্রে টেবিলের বিভিন্ন সংক্ আমরা ট্যাব জিজিসিনিকে প্রস্তাব করি, যা টেবিল, জ্ঞান গ্রাফ এবং প্রশিক্ষণের পুরোপুরি কাঠামো গ্রাফ কনভোলেশন নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে এবং টেবিলের উপাদানের জন জ্ঞানের অসম্পূর্ণ ব্যাপারে ট্যাবিজিসিনের বিভিন্ন বিষয়বস্তু এবং ধরনের আবিষ্কারের জন্য ব্যবহার করা যায়। ৫ বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটে পরীক্ষা ব্যবহার করে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে ট্যাব জানাচ্ছি টেবিলের বিরুদ্ধে বেশ কিছু রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের বেসেলাইনের জন্য প্রয', 'et': 'Olemasolevad meetodid olemite ja tüüpidega tabeli annoteerimiseks kajastavad tabeli struktuuri graafiliste mudelite abil või õpivad tabeli kirjete manustamist ilma kogu süntaktilist struktuuri arvestamata. Pakume välja TabGCN, mis kasutab graafiliste konvolutsioonivõrkude abil tabelite, teadmiste graafikute ja koolituse märkuste kogu struktuuri ning õpib ühiselt tabelielementide, samuti olemite ja tüüpide manustamist. Teadmiste ebatäielikkuse arvestamiseks saab TabGCNi manustamisi kasutada uute olemite ja tüüpide avastamiseks. Kasutades katseid viie võrdlusandmekogumiga, näitame, et TabGCN on märkimisväärselt parem kui mitmed tipptasemel baasjooned tabeli annoteerimiseks, näidates samas paljutõotavat jõudlust järgmise etapi tabeliga seotud rakendustes.', 'ca': "Els enfocaments existents per anotació de taula amb entitats i tipus o capturen l'estructura de taula usant models gràfics, o aprenen incorporacions d'entrades de taula sense comptar per l'estructura sinàctica completa. Proposem TabGCN, que utilitza Gràfics Convolucions Networks per capturar l'estructura completa de taules, el gràfic del coneixement i les anotacions d'entrenament, i aprenen conjuntament incorporacions per elements de taula, així com les entitats i tipus. To account for knowledge incompleteness, TabGCN's embeddings can be used to discover new entities and types.  Utilitzant experiments en cinc conjunts de dades de referència, demostram que TabGCN supera significativament múltiples línies de referència d'última generació per anotació de taula, mentre mostra prestacions prometedores en aplicacions relacionades amb taula en avall.", 'am': 'ሠንጠረዥ የጽሑፎች፣ እውቀት ቀለሞች እና አስተማሪ አካባቢዎችን ለመያዝ እና ለገበታው አካባቢዎች እና አካባቢዎች እና ዓይነቶችን ለመማር የተጠቃሚ የጽሑፎችን መሠረት እና የጽሑፎችን ማቀናቀል እና በመጠቀም ይማራሉ፡፡ አዲስ አካላት እና ዓይነቶችን ለማግኘት የTabGCN መልዕክቶች ይችላል፡፡ በአምስት benchmark ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም፣ ታቦግGCN በአካባቢ ሁኔታ-የ-art መደገፊያዎችን ለገበታው ማስታወቂያ እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'fi': 'Olemassa olevat lähestymistavat taulukon merkintöihin entiteeteillä ja tyypeillä joko kuvaavat taulukon rakenteen graafisten mallien avulla tai oppivat taulukon merkintöjen upotuksia ottamatta huomioon koko syntaktista rakennetta. Ehdotamme TabGCN:ää, joka käyttää Graph Convolutional Networks -verkkoja taulukoiden, tietokaavion ja koulutusmerkintöjen koko rakenteen tallentamiseen ja yhdessä oppii upotuksia taulukon elementeille sekä entiteeteille ja tyypeille. Tietojen puutteellisuuden huomioimiseksi TabGCN:n upotuksia voidaan käyttää uusien entiteettien ja tyyppien löytämiseen. Käyttämällä kokeita viidellä vertailuaineistolla osoitamme TabGCN:n suoriutuvan merkittävästi useista viimeisimpistä taulukon annotoinnin perusviivoista, samalla kun se näyttää lupaavan suorituskyvyn loppupään taulukoihin liittyvissä sovelluksissa.', 'cs': 'Existující přístupy pro anotaci tabulky s entitami a typy buď zachycují strukturu tabulky pomocí grafických modelů, nebo se naučí vložení položek tabulky bez zohlednění kompletní syntaktické struktury. Navrhujeme TabGCN, který používá Graph Convolutional Networks k zachycení kompletní struktury tabulek, znalostního grafu a školicích anotací a společně se učí vložení prvků tabulky, entit a typů. Pro zohlednění neúplnosti znalostí lze vložení TabGCN použít k objevování nových entit a typů. Pomocí experimentů na pěti referenčních datových sadách ukazujeme, že TabGCN výrazně překonává více nejmodernějších základních linek pro anotaci tabulek, přičemž ukazuje slibný výkon v následných aplikacích souvisejících s tabulkami.', 'jv': 'tab Awak dhéwé nggunakake TabGN, sing wis nggawe Graph convolution netwark nggo yen nggawe sistem bukar nggawe daftar, ingkang diputêrung kanggo ngerasakno, lan ijol-ijol sing ngerasakno gawe lan mbukakipun ciptaaken kanggo nyelarakno-ciptaaken karo ngono cah-ciptaaken lan alam. Ing akont kanggo ngerasai ora kapen, baddengan TabGSN iso dianggap kanggo kowe isih sing dibutuhke karo klebu sing gak dhéwé. Ngawe ngubah perintah sing sampeyan 5 bench dataset, kita ngomongke TabGN ngerasah barang langgar banter', 'sk': 'Obstoječi pristopi za pripombe tabele s entitetami in vrstami bodisi zajemajo strukturo tabele z grafičnimi modeli ali se naučijo vdelav vnosov tabele, ne da bi upoštevali celotno sintaktično strukturo. Predlagamo TabGCN, ki uporablja grafična konvolucijska omrežja za zajem celotne strukture tabel, graf znanja in opomb usposabljanja ter skupaj uči vdelave elementov tabele ter entitet in vrst. Da bi upoštevali nepopolnost znanja, lahko vdelave TabGCN uporabite za odkrivanje novih entitet in vrst. Z uporabo eksperimentov na petih referenčnih naborih podatkov smo pokazali, da TabGCN znatno presega več najsodobnejših osnovnih linij za označevanje tabel, obenem pa kaže obetavno učinkovitost pri aplikacijah, povezanih s tabelami.', 'ha': "Yi amfani da shiryoyin abun da abun da nau'in abun, ko kuma ka sami tsarin abun da misãlai na graphical, ko ka sami ƙoyoyoyin da aka shigar da su cikin abun bila ya hisãbi da cikakken layin syntactic. We propose TabGCN, that uses Graph Convolutional Networks to capture the complete structure of tables, knowledge graph and the training annotations, and jointly learns embeddings for table elements as well as the entities and types.  Akwai ƙidãya wa cikakken ilmi, za'a iya amfani da embodin TabGC don a gane abubuwa da nau'i-nau'i. Yi amfani da jarrabãwa kan danne-bangon 5, za'a nuna TabGC mai significant outperforma rubutun-state-the-art wa zane-zane-tabar, kuma idan ya nuna mai yiwuwa da ake yi wa alkawari a kan shiryoyin ayukan na tabar-na-downriver.", 'he': 'גישות קיימות למכתבות שולחן עם יחידות וטיפוסים או לתפוס את מבנה השולחן באמצעות דוגמנים גרפיים אנו מציעים TabGCN, אשר משתמש ברשת שינוי גראפ כדי לתפוס את המבנה המושלם של שולחנות, גראפ הידע והציונים האימונים, וללמד יחד תוכניות לאמנטים שולחנים, כמו גם היחידות וטיפוסים. כדי לחשבון על מידע לא מלא, תוכניות TabGCN יכולות להשתמש כדי לגלות יחידות וסוגים חדשים. באמצעות ניסויים על 5 קבוצות מידע רמזים, אנו מראים שTabGCN מגביר באופן משמעותי את מספר קווי הבסיס המיוחדים לשולחן, בזמן שהופיע ביצועים מבטיחים על היישומים הקשורים לשולחן התחתון.', 'bo': 'Existing approaches for table annotation with entities and types either capture the structure of table using graphical models, or learn embeddings of table entries without accounting for the complete syntactic structure. We propose TabGCN, that uses Graph Convolutional Networks to capture the complete structure of tables, knowledge graph and the training annotations, and jointly learns embeddings for table elements as well as the entities and types. མ་ཤེས་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ལ་ཕན་འབྲས་མེད་ལ་ཐོ་ཁོངས་ལ་སྒྲིག་TabGCN་ཡི་ནང་དུ་འཛུལ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ ང་ཚོས་TabGCN་ལྟ་བུའི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཕུང་གི་ཚད་ལྔའི་ནང་ཐོག་ལས་སྟོན་པའི་བརྟག་བཤད་ཆེན་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'ECOL-R : Encouraging Copying in Novel Object Captioning with Reinforcement Learning', 'fr': "ECOL-R\xa0: Encourager la copie dans les nouveaux sous-titres d'objets grâce à l'apprentissage par renforcement", 'pt': 'ECOL-R: Incentivando a Cópia em Legendagem de Objetos Novos com Aprendizado por Reforço', 'ar': 'ECOL-R: تشجيع النسخ في تسمية كائن جديد مع التعلم المعزز', 'es': 'ECOL-R: Fomentar la copia en la subtitulación de objetos novedosos con el aprendizaje', 'ja': 'ECOL - R ：強化学習による新規オブジェクトキャプションのコピーの奨励', 'hi': 'ECOL-R: सुदृढीकरण सीखने के साथ उपन्यास ऑब्जेक्ट कैप्शनिंग में कॉपी को प्रोत्साहित करना', 'zh': 'ECOL-R:新字幕复制', 'ru': 'ECOL-R: Поощрение копирования новых объектов с помощью обучения подкреплению', 'ga': 'ECOL-R: Cóipeáil a Spreagadh i dTeidealú Oibiachta Úrscéalta le Foghlaim Neartaithe', 'hu': 'ECOL-R: A másolás ösztönzése az új objektumok feliratozásában a megerősített tanulással', 'el': 'Ενθάρρυνση της αντιγραφής σε λεζάντες νέων αντικειμένων με μάθηση ενίσχυσης', 'it': "ECOL-R: Incoraggiare la copia nella didascalia di oggetti nuovi con l'apprendimento di rinforzo", 'ka': 'ECOL-R: კოპორაცია Novel Object Captioning with Reinforcement Learning', 'lt': 'ECOL-R: Skatinti kopijavimą naujo objekto antraštėje stiprinant mokymąsi', 'kk': 'ECOL- R: Қайталау оқытумен Novel нысанның көшірмесін көшірмелеу', 'ml': 'ECOL- R: വീണ്ടും പഠിക്കുന്നതിനൊപ്പം നോവല്\u200d വസ്തുവിന്റെ പകര്\u200dത്തുന്നതില്\u200d പകര്\u200dത്തുന്നത് ഉറപ്പാക്കുന്നു', 'mk': 'ECOL-R: охрабрување на копирање во капитацијата на новите објекти со зајакнување на учењето', 'ms': 'ECOL-R: Menyegerakkan Salinan dalam Capsyen Objek Baru dengan Pelajaran Pengesahan', 'mt': 'ECOL-R: L-inkoraġġiment tal-Kopjar fit-Tkabbir ta’ Oġġetti Ġodda bit-Tagħlim tat-Tisħiħ', 'pl': 'ECOL-R: Zachęcanie do kopiowania w napisach nowych obiektów dzięki uczeniu się wzmocnienia', 'no': 'ECOL-R: Encouraging Copying in Novel Object Captioning with Reinforcement Learning', 'mn': 'ECOL-R: Novel Object Captioning with Reinforcement Learning', 'so': 'ECOL-R: Encouraging Copying in Novel Object Captioning with Reinforcement Learning', 'sr': 'ECOL-R: Pojačavanje kopiranja u novom objektu sa učenjem pojačanja', 'ro': 'ECOL-R: Încurajarea copierii în subtitrarea obiectelor noi cu învățarea consolidată', 'sv': 'ECOL-R: Uppmuntra kopiering i nya objekt textning med förstärkt lärande', 'si': 'ECOL', 'ur': 'ECOL', 'ta': 'ECOL- R: நிலை பொருளில் நகலெடுப்பதை மறுவாக்கம் கற்றுக்கொண்டு பிடிப்பதில் முயற்சிக்கிறது', 'uz': 'ECOL- R: Tahrirlash', 'vi': 'Công ty EcoL-R: Động lực kết hợp trong phim động vật tiểu liên', 'bg': 'Насърчаване на копирането в надписите на нови обекти с подсилване на обучението', 'hr': 'ECOL-R: Pojačavanje kopiranja u novom objektu sa učenjem pojačanja', 'da': 'ECOL-R: Tilskyndelse til kopiering i teksttekster til nye objekter med forstærkelseslæring', 'nl': 'ECOL-R: Kopiëren aanmoedigen in nieuwe objectbijschriften met versterking leren', 'id': 'ECOL-R: Menangkuh Menyalin dalam Captioning Objek Novel dengan Pelajaran Penyukuran', 'de': 'ECOL-R: Förderung des Kopierens in neuartigen Objektbeschriftungen mit Reinforcement Learning', 'fa': 'ECOL-R: Encouraging Copying in Novel Object Captioning with Reinforcement Learning', 'sw': 'ECOL', 'tr': 'ECOL-R: Novel Object Captioning with Reinforcement Learning', 'sq': 'ECOL-R: inkurajimi i kopjimit në titullin e objekteve të reja me mësimin e forcimit', 'am': 'ECOL-R:', 'ko': 'ECOL-R: 학습을 강화하여 새로운 대상 자막에 복사 권장', 'hy': 'ԷԿՕԼ-Ռ. Նոր օբյեկտների գրավորման խրախուսելը ուժեղացված սովորելու միջոցով', 'az': 'ECOL-R: Novel Object Captioning with Reinforcement Learning', 'af': 'ECOL-R: Verskaffing Kopie in Novel Objekt Kapitensie met Versterking Leer', 'bn': 'ECOL-R: পুনরায় শিক্ষা শিক্ষা দিয়ে নোভেল বস্তুতে কপি করার উদ্দেশ্য উৎসাহ প্রদান করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'ECOL-R: Pojačavanje kopiranja u novom objektu sa učenjem pojačanja', 'ca': "ECOL-R: Encorajar la copiació en el capítol d'objectes noves amb l'aprenentatge de reforç", 'cs': 'ECOL-R: Podpora kopírování v titulcích nových objektů pomocí posíleného učení', 'fi': 'ECOL-R: Kopioinnin kannustaminen uusien objektien kuvatekstien kopiointiin tehostamalla oppimista', 'et': 'ECOL-R: uudsete objektide pealdiste kopeerimise julgustamine tugevdatud õppega', 'jv': 'ESOl-R:', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'ECOL-R: מעודדת העתק בתפיסה של אובייקטים חדשים עם לימוד גיבוי', 'sk': 'ECOL-R: spodbujanje kopiranja v napisovanju novih predmetov z okrepljenim učenjem', 'bo': 'ECOL-R: Novel Object Captioning with Reinforcement Learning'}
{'en': 'Novel Object Captioning is a zero-shot Image Captioning task requiring describing objects not seen in the training captions, but for which information is available from external object detectors. The key challenge is to select and describe all salient detected novel objects in the input images. In this paper, we focus on this challenge and propose the ECOL-R model (Encouraging Copying of Object Labels with Reinforced Learning), a copy-augmented transformer model that is encouraged to accurately describe the novel object labels. This is achieved via a specialised reward function in the SCST reinforcement learning framework (Rennie et al., 2017) that encourages novel object mentions while maintaining the caption quality. We further restrict the SCST training to the images where detected objects are mentioned in reference captions to train the ECOL-R model. We additionally improve our copy mechanism via Abstract Labels, which transfer knowledge from known to novel object types, and a Morphological Selector, which determines the appropriate inflected forms of novel object labels. The resulting model sets new state-of-the-art on the nocaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) and held-out COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016) benchmarks.', 'ar': 'تعد Novel Object Captioning مهمة تسمية توضيحية للصور لا يتم التقاطها مطلقًا وتتطلب وصف الكائنات التي لم يتم رؤيتها في التعليقات التوضيحية للتدريب ، ولكن تتوفر المعلومات الخاصة بها من أجهزة الكشف عن الكائنات الخارجية. يتمثل التحدي الرئيسي في تحديد ووصف جميع الكائنات الجديدة التي تم اكتشافها في الصور المدخلة. في هذه الورقة ، نركز على هذا التحدي ونقترح نموذج ECOL-R (تشجيع نسخ تسميات الكائنات باستخدام التعلم المعزز) ، وهو نموذج محولات معززة بالنسخ يتم تشجيعه على وصف تسميات الكائنات الجديدة بدقة. يتم تحقيق ذلك من خلال وظيفة المكافأة المتخصصة في إطار التعلم التعزيزي لـ SCST (Rennie et al. ، 2017) التي تشجع على ذكر الأشياء الجديدة مع الحفاظ على جودة التسمية التوضيحية. كما قمنا بتقييد تدريب SCST على الصور حيث يتم ذكر الكائنات المكتشفة في التعليقات المرجعية لتدريب نموذج ECOL-R. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نقوم بتحسين آلية النسخ الخاصة بنا من خلال الملصقات الخلاصة ، والتي تنقل المعرفة من أنواع الكائنات المعروفة إلى الجديدة ، والمحدد الصرفي ، الذي يحدد الأشكال المناسبة لتسميات الكائنات الجديدة. يحدد النموذج الناتج أحدث المعايير على nocaps (Agrawal et al. ، 2019) ومعايير COCO (Hendricks et al. ، 2016).', 'fr': "Le sous-titrage d'objets novateurs est une tâche de sous-titrage d'image zéro plan qui nécessite de décrire des objets qui ne figurent pas dans les sous-titres d'entraînement, mais pour lesquels des informations sont disponibles auprès de détecteurs d'objets externes. Le principal défi consiste à sélectionner et à décrire tous les nouveaux objets saillants détectés dans les images d'entrée. Dans cet article, nous nous concentrons sur ce défi et proposons le modèle ECOL-R (Encouraging Copying of Object Labels with Reinforced Learning), un modèle de transformateur augmenté par copie qui est encouragé à décrire avec précision les nouvelles étiquettes d'objets. Ceci est réalisé via une fonction de récompense spécialisée dans le cadre d'apprentissage par renforcement SCST (Rennie et al., 2017) qui encourage les nouvelles mentions d'objets tout en maintenant la qualité de la légende. Nous limitons également la formation SCST aux images où les objets détectés sont mentionnés dans les légendes de référence pour entraîner le modèle ECOL-R. Nous améliorons également notre mécanisme de copie via les étiquettes abstraites, qui transfèrent les connaissances des types d'objets connus aux nouveaux types d'objets, et un sélecteur morphologique, qui détermine les formes fléchies appropriées des nouvelles étiquettes d'objets. Le modèle qui en résulte établit de nouvelles avancées sur les repères nocaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) et COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016).", 'es': 'La subtitulación de objetos novedosos es una tarea de subtitulado de imágenes cero que requiere describir objetos que no se ven en las leyendas de entrenamiento, pero para los que hay información disponible en detectores de objetos externos. El desafío clave es seleccionar y describir todos los objetos novedosos detectados destacados en las imágenes de entrada. En este artículo, nos centramos en este desafío y proponemos el modelo ECOL-R (Fomentar la copia de etiquetas de objetos con aprendizaje reforzado), un modelo de transformador de copia aumentada que se alienta a describir con precisión las nuevas etiquetas de objetos. Esto se logra a través de una función de recompensa especializada en el marco de aprendizaje por refuerzo de SCST (Rennie et al., 2017) que fomenta las menciones de objetos novedosos al tiempo que mantiene la calidad de los subtítulos. Restringimos aún más el entrenamiento de SCST a las imágenes en las que los objetos detectados se mencionan en las leyendas de referencia para entrenar el modelo ECOL-R. Además, mejoramos nuestro mecanismo de copia mediante etiquetas abstractas, que transfieren el conocimiento de tipos de objetos conocidos a nuevos, y un selector morfológico, que determina las formas de flexión apropiadas de las etiquetas de objetos novedosos. El modelo resultante establece un nuevo estado de la técnica en los puntos de referencia sin límites (Agrawal et al., 2019) y COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016).', 'pt': 'Novel Object Captioning é uma tarefa de captura de imagem de tiro zero que requer a descrição de objetos não vistos nas legendas de treinamento, mas para os quais as informações estão disponíveis em detectores de objetos externos. O principal desafio é selecionar e descrever todos os novos objetos detectados salientes nas imagens de entrada. Neste artigo, focamos nesse desafio e propomos o modelo ECOL-R (Encorajando a Cópia de Rótulos de Objetos com Aprendizado Reforçado), um modelo de transformador de cópia aumentada que é incentivado a descrever com precisão os novos rótulos de objetos. Isso é alcançado por meio de uma função de recompensa especializada na estrutura de aprendizado por reforço SCST (Rennie et al., 2017) que incentiva novas menções de objetos, mantendo a qualidade da legenda. Restringimos ainda mais o treinamento SCST às imagens em que os objetos detectados são mencionados nas legendas de referência para treinar o modelo ECOL-R. Além disso, melhoramos nosso mecanismo de cópia por meio de rótulos abstratos, que transferem conhecimento de tipos de objetos conhecidos para novos, e um seletor morfológico, que determina as formas flexionadas apropriadas de novos rótulos de objetos. O modelo resultante define novos benchmarks de última geração nos benchmarks nocaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) e COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016).', 'ja': 'Novel Object Captioningは、トレーニングキャプションには表示されていないが、外部オブジェクト検出器から情報を入手できるオブジェクトを記述する必要があるゼロショット画像キャプションタスクです。 主要な課題は、入力画像内のすべての顕著な検出された新規オブジェクトを選択して説明することです。 本稿では、この課題に焦点を当て、新規のオブジェクトラベルを正確に記述するために奨励されるコピー拡張トランスモデルであるECOL - Rモデル（ Reinforced Learningでオブジェクトラベルのコピーを奨励する）を提案する。 これは、SCST強化学習フレームワーク（ Rennie et al., 2017 ）の専門的な報酬関数を通じて達成され、キャプションの品質を維持しながら新規のオブジェクトへの言及を奨励します。 さらに、SCSTトレーニングは、ECOL - Rモデルをトレーニングするために、検出されたオブジェクトが参照キャプションで言及されている画像に制限します。 私たちは、既知のオブジェクトタイプから新規オブジェクトタイプに知識を転送するAbstract Labelsと、新規オブジェクトラベルの適切な屈折形態を決定するMorphological Selectorを介して、コピーメカニズムをさらに改善します。 結果として得られたモデルは、ノーキャップ（ Agrawal et al., 2019 ）とホールドアウトココ（ Hendricks et al., 2016 ）ベンチマークに新しい最先端を設定します。', 'zh': '所新者字幕零拍摄之象字幕任也,言练字幕中未见者,而外检测器得其息。 要是选择和描述输入图像中所有检测到的奇特的新。 夫文者,重为ECOL-R(劝为学复制),此复制之强变压器,劝之正也。 此以SCST强学框架劝功之(Rennie,2017)劝新,兼守字幕量也。 更以 SCST 教限为参考标题及所检之象,以习 ECOL-R 模形。 又因抽象(象标)与形态学选择器(定新,改我复制制)抽象移知所在。 由是生形于nocaps(Agrawal等,2019)与执COCO(Hendricks等,2016)准设新最先进之术。', 'ru': 'Novel Object Captioning - это задача с нулевым выстрелом Image Captioning, требующая описания объектов, которые не видны в обучающих надписях, но для которых информация доступна из внешних детекторов объектов. Основная задача заключается в выборе и описании всех основных обнаруженных новых объектов на входных изображениях. В этой статье мы фокусируемся на этой задаче и предлагаем модель ECOL-R (Поощрение копирования меток объектов с усиленным обучением), модель преобразователя с расширением копирования, которая поощряется к точному описанию новых меток объектов. Это достигается с помощью специализированной функции вознаграждения в рамках обучения усилению SCST (Rennie et al., 2017), которая поощряет упоминания новых объектов при сохранении качества подписей. Мы также ограничиваем обучение SCST изображениями, где обнаруженные объекты упоминаются в ссылочных надписях, чтобы обучить модель ECOL-R. Мы дополнительно улучшаем наш механизм копирования через Абстрактные Метки, которые передают знания от известных к новым объектным типам, и Морфологический Селектор, который определяет соответствующие перегибаемые формы новых объектных меток. Полученная модель устанавливает новые современные контрольные показатели nocaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) и удерживаемого COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016).', 'hi': 'नोवेल ऑब्जेक्ट कैप्शनिंग एक शून्य-शॉट छवि कैप्शनिंग कार्य है जिसमें प्रशिक्षण कैप्शन में नहीं देखी गई वस्तुओं का वर्णन करने की आवश्यकता होती है, लेकिन जिसके लिए बाहरी ऑब्जेक्ट डिटेक्टरों से जानकारी उपलब्ध होती है। मुख्य चुनौती का चयन करें और इनपुट छवियों में सभी प्रमुख पता लगाया उपन्यास वस्तुओं का वर्णन करने के लिए है। इस पेपर में, हम इस चुनौती पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं और ECOL-R मॉडल (प्रबलित सीखने के साथ ऑब्जेक्ट लेबल की प्रतिलिपि बनाने को प्रोत्साहित करना), एक कॉपी-संवर्धित ट्रांसफॉर्मर मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जिसे उपन्यास ऑब्जेक्ट लेबल का सटीक वर्णन करने के लिए प्रोत्साहित किया जाता है। यह एससीएसटी सुदृढीकरण सीखने के ढांचे (रेनी एट अल. 2017) में एक विशेष इनाम समारोह के माध्यम से प्राप्त किया जाता है जो कैप्शन की गुणवत्ता को बनाए रखते हुए उपन्यास ऑब्जेक्ट उल्लेखों को प्रोत्साहित करता है। हम आगे एससीएसटी प्रशिक्षण को उन छवियों तक सीमित करते हैं जहां ईसीओएल-आर मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए संदर्भ कैप्शन में पता लगाई गई वस्तुओं का उल्लेख किया गया है। हम इसके अतिरिक्त सार लेबल के माध्यम से हमारे प्रतिलिपि तंत्र में सुधार करते हैं, जो ज्ञात से उपन्यास ऑब्जेक्ट प्रकारों में ज्ञान को स्थानांतरित करते हैं, और एक रूपात्मक चयनकर्ता, जो उपन्यास ऑब्जेक्ट लेबल के उपयुक्त inflected रूपों को निर्धारित करता है। परिणामी मॉडल नोकैप्स (अग्रवाल एट अल. 2019) और आयोजित-आउट कोको (हेंड्रिक्स एट अल।', 'ga': 'Is tasc le haghaidh Fotheidealú Íomhánna náid é Teidealú Oibiachtaí Úrscéalta a éilíonn cur síos a dhéanamh ar réada nach bhfeictear sna fortheidil oiliúna, ach a bhfuil faisnéis ar fáil ina leith ó bhrathadóirí réad seachtracha. Is é an príomhdhúshlán ná gach réad núíosach braite suntasach sna híomhánna ionchuir a roghnú agus cur síos a dhéanamh air. Sa pháipéar seo, dírímid ar an dúshlán seo agus molaimid an tsamhail ECOL-R (Cóipeáil Lipéid Oibiachta a Spreagadh le Foghlaim Neartaithe), múnla claochladán breisithe cóipe a spreagtar chun cur síos beacht a dhéanamh ar na lipéid réad nua. Baintear é seo amach trí fheidhm luaíochta speisialaithe i gcreat foghlama treisithe SCST (Rennie et al., 2017) a spreagann tagairtí réad nua agus cáilíocht na fotheideal á chothabháil ag an am céanna. Cuirimid srian breise ar oiliúint SCST chuig na híomhánna ina luaitear réada braite i bhfotheidil tagartha chun an tsamhail ECOL-R a oiliúint. Feabhsaítear freisin ár meicníocht chóipeála trí Lipéid Coimrithe, a aistríonn eolas ó chineálacha réada eolacha go cineálacha réad nua, agus Roghnóir Moirfeolaíoch, a chinneann na foirmeacha infhillte cuí de lipéid réad núíosacha. Socraíonn an tsamhail a d’eascair as na tagarmharcanna nua den scoth ar na tagarmharcanna nocaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) agus COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016).', 'hu': 'Az Új objektumok feliratozása egy nulla felvételű képfeliratozási feladat, amely a képzési feliratokban nem látható objektumok leírását igényli, de amelyekre vonatkozóan külső objektumérzékelők információk állnak rendelkezésre. A legfontosabb kihívás az, hogy kiválasszuk és leírjuk az összes kiemelkedő észlelt új objektumot a bemeneti képeken. Ebben a tanulmányban erre a kihívásra összpontosítunk, és javasoljuk az ECOL-R modellt (az objektumcímkék erősített tanulással történő másolásának ösztönzése), egy másolásbővített transzformátor modellt, amely arra ösztönzi, hogy pontosan leírja az új objektumcímkéket. Ezt az SCST megerősítési tanulási keretrendszer speciális jutalmazási funkciójával érhetjük el (Rennie et al., 2017), amely az új tárgyak említését ösztönzi, miközben fenntartja a felirat minőségét. Továbbá az SCST képzést azokra a képekre korlátozzuk, ahol az észlelt objektumokat hivatkozási feliratokban említik az ECOL-R modell edzésére. Továbbá javítjuk a másolási mechanizmust az ismert objektumtípusokról az új objektumtípusokra átadó Absztrakt Labels segítségével, valamint egy Morfológiai Selector segítségével, amely meghatározza az új objektumcímkék megfelelő inflexált formáit. Az így kapott modell új korszerű mutatókat állít fel a nocaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) és a kitartott COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016) referenciaértékeken.', 'ka': 'Novel Object Captioning არის 0-shot Image Captioning task requiring describing objects not seen in the training captions, but for which information is available from external object detectors. გასაღების გამოსახულება არის ყველა სილიენტის განახულებული პრომენტის სახელი. ამ დოკუნეში, ჩვენ განვითარებით და ECOL-R მოდელის მონდელის კონფიკურაციას მოვიწყებთ, რომელიც კონფიკურაციული განვითარებით, რომელიც ახალგაზრდება პრობექტის ლაბელობის კონფიკურაციას. ეს სპეციალური სამუშაო ფუნქციის გამოყენება SCST სწავლებელი სწავლებელი ფუნქციაში (Rennie et al., 2017) რომელიც პრომენტის სამუშაო ობიექტის შესახებ, რომელიც სამუშაო სა ჩვენ უფრო დავადგენებთ SCST სტრინციას სურათების სურათზე, სადაც განაკვირული ობიექტები განსაზღვრებული განსაზღვრებულია ECOL-R მოდელის შესაბამისთვის. ჩვენ დამატებით აბსტრაქტიკური ლაბლის გამოყენება, რომელიც ცნობიერები ცნობიერებისგან ცნობიერების პრობექტის ტიპებისგან და მოპოლოგიკური მონიშნელი, რომელიც განსაზღვრავს შესაძლებელი შემდეგ მოდელეში ახალი სურათების განსაზღვრება (Agrawal et al., 2019) და COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016) ბენქმარკების განსაზღვრება.', 'el': 'Η νέα λεζάντα αντικειμένων είναι μια εργασία που απαιτεί περιγραφή αντικειμένων που δεν εμφανίζονται στις λεζάντες εκπαίδευσης, αλλά για την οποία είναι διαθέσιμες πληροφορίες από εξωτερικούς ανιχνευτές αντικειμένων. Η βασική πρόκληση είναι να επιλέξετε και να περιγράψετε όλα τα σημαντικά ανιχνευμένα νέα αντικείμενα στις εικόνες εισόδου. Στην παρούσα εργασία, εστιάζουμε σε αυτή την πρόκληση και προτείνουμε το μοντέλο ένα μοντέλο μετασχηματιστή που ενθαρρύνεται να περιγράψει με ακρίβεια τις νέες ετικέτες αντικειμένων. Αυτό επιτυγχάνεται μέσω μιας εξειδικευμένης λειτουργίας ανταμοιβής στο πλαίσιο μάθησης ενίσχυσης που ενθαρρύνει τις αναφορές νέων αντικειμένων διατηρώντας παράλληλα την ποιότητα λεζάντας. Περιορίζουμε περαιτέρω την εκπαίδευση στις εικόνες όπου ανιχνευμένα αντικείμενα αναφέρονται στις λεζάντες αναφοράς για την εκπαίδευση του μοντέλου ECOL-R. Επιπλέον, βελτιώνουμε τον μηχανισμό αντιγραφής μας μέσω των αφηρημένων ετικετών, οι οποίες μεταφέρουν γνώσεις από γνωστούς σε νέους τύπους αντικειμένων, και ενός Μορφολογικού Επιλογητή, ο οποίος καθορίζει τις κατάλληλες στρεβλωμένες μορφές ετικετών νέων αντικειμένων. Το προκύπτον μοντέλο θέτει νέα πρότυπα αναφοράς για τις νυκτερινές (κ.α., 2019) και τις καθυστερημένες (κ.α., Χέντρικς κ.α., 2016).', 'it': "Il sottotitolo di oggetti novelli è un'attività di sottotitolo di immagini a scatto zero che richiede la descrizione di oggetti non visti nelle didascalie dell'addestramento, ma per i quali sono disponibili informazioni da rilevatori di oggetti esterni. La sfida principale è selezionare e descrivere tutti gli oggetti nuovi rilevati salienti nelle immagini di input. In questo articolo, ci concentriamo su questa sfida e proponiamo il modello ECOL-R (Incoraggiare la copia di etichette di oggetti con apprendimento rinforzato), un modello di trasformatore copy-augmented che viene incoraggiato a descrivere accuratamente le nuove etichette di oggetti. Questo è ottenuto tramite una funzione di ricompensa specializzata nel framework SCST di apprendimento di rinforzo (Rennie et al., 2017) che incoraggia le menzioni di oggetti nuovi mantenendo la qualità della didascalia. Inoltre, limitiamo l'addestramento SCST alle immagini in cui gli oggetti rilevati sono menzionati nelle didascalie di riferimento per addestrare il modello ECOL-R. Miglioramo inoltre il nostro meccanismo di copia tramite Etichette astratte, che trasferiscono conoscenze da tipi di oggetti noti a nuovi, e un Selettore Morfologico, che determina le forme flesse appropriate di etichette di oggetti nuovi. Il modello risultante stabilisce nuovi parametri di riferimento per i nocaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) e COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016).", 'kk': 'Жаңа нысанның айдары - нөл- шофт кескінді айдарындағы тапсырма. Оқу айдарында көрінбейтін нысандарды анықтау керек, бірақ сыртқы нысанның анықтаушыларынан қай мәліметі бар. Кіріс кескіндерінде барлық салиентті таңдау және анықтау үшін кіріс нысандарын таңдау. Бұл қағазда, біз бұл өзгерістерді көздейміз және ECOL-R үлгісін (Қайталап оқыту үшін нысандарды көшірмелеу үлгісін көшірмелейміз), жаңа нысандар жарлығын дұрыс анықтау үшін көшірмелеу үлгісін көшірмелейміз Бұл SCST оқыту бағдарламасының (Rennie et al., 2017) арқылы өзгертілген жұмыс функциясы арқылы (Rennie et al., 2017) оқыту бағдарламасының сапасын сақтап жатқанда жаңа нысанды түсіндіреді. Біз SCST оқытуын ECOL-R үлгісін оқыту үшін табылған нысандардың сілтеме айдарында жазылатын кескіндерге шектеп тұрамыз. Біз көшірмелеу механизмімізді абстракт жарлықтар арқылы жақсартып, білімді жаңа нысандар түрлерінен, морфологикалық таңдаушысы, ол жаңа нысандар жарлықтарының керек түрлерін анықтайды. Негізгі үлгі нокаптар (Agrawal et al., 2019) және COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016) бағдарламаларының жаңа күйінің күйіні орнатады.', 'ms': 'Capsyen Objek Baru adalah tugas Capsyen Imej tembakan sifar yang memerlukan menggambarkan objek yang tidak dilihat dalam tajuk latihan, tetapi maklumat yang tersedia dari pengesan objek luaran. Tandakan kunci ialah memilih dan menggambarkan semua objek baru yang dikesan yang salient dalam imej input. Dalam kertas ini, kami fokus pada cabaran ini dan mencadangkan model ECOL-R (Encouraging Copying of Object Labels with Reinforced Learning), model pengubah yang meningkat salinan yang dicadangkan untuk menggambarkan dengan tepat label objek baru. Ini dicapai melalui fungsi hadiah khusus dalam kerangka pembelajaran penyokong SCST (Rennie et al., 2017) yang mendorong objek baru disebut semasa menyimpan kualiti tajuk. Kami lebih terhad latihan SCST kepada imej di mana objek dikesan disebut dalam tajuk rujukan untuk melatih model ECOL-R. Kami tambahan meningkatkan mekanisme salinan kami melalui Label Abstrakt, yang memindahkan pengetahuan dari jenis objek yang diketahui kepada jenis objek baru, dan Pemilih Morfologi, yang menentukan bentuk yang sesuai disebabkan label objek baru. Model yang menghasilkan menetapkan keadaan baru pada tanda-tanda nocaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) dan COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016) yang ditahan.', 'lt': 'Novel Object Captioning is a zero-shot Image Captioning task requiring describing objects not seen in the training captions, but for which information is available from external object detectors.  Pagrindinis iššūkis yra atrinkti ir aprašyti visus svarbius aptiktus naujus objektus įvestuose vaizduose. Šiame dokumente daugiausia dėmesio skiriame šiam iššūkiui ir siūlome ECOL-R model į (skatinti objektų ženklų kopijavimą stiprinant mokymąsi), kuris yra kopijai padidintas transformatoriaus model is, skatinamas tiksliai aprašyti naujus objektų ženklus. Tai pasiekta naudojant specializuotą atlyginimo funkciją SCST stiprinimo mokymosi sistemoje (Rennie et al., 2017 m.), kuria skatinama paminėti naujus objektus ir kartu išlaikoma antraštinės dalies kokybė. Be to, SCST mokymą apribojame tik vaizdais, kuriuose aptikti objektai yra nurodyti nuorodose ECOL-R modeliui treniruoti. Be to, geriname savo kopijų mechanizmą naudojant abstraktus ženklus, kurie perduoda žinias iš žinomų naujų objektų tipų, ir morfologinį rinkėją, kuris nustato atitinkamas naujų objektų ženklų formas. Atlikus šį model į nustatomi nauji pažangieji standartai, susiję su nakopiais (Agrawal et al., 2019 m.) ir išsaugotais COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016 m.).', 'mk': 'Напишувањето на нов објект е задача за напишување на слики со нула снимка која бара опис на објекти кои не се видени во насловите на објектот, туку за кои информации се достапни од надворешни детектори на објекти. Клучниот предизвик е да се изберат и опишат сите познати откриени нови објекти во внатрешните слики. Во овој документ, се фокусираме на овој предизвик и го предложуваме моделот ECOL-R (Охрабрување на копирање на ознаките на објекти со зајакнато учење), модел на трансформатор кој е охрабрен да ги опише точно новите ознаки на објекти. Ова се постигнува преку специјализирана функција на награда во рамката за учење за зајакнување на СКСТ (Rennie et al., 2017), која охрабрува нови објекти да се споменат и да се одржи квалитетот на насловот. Понатаму го ограничуваме обуката СКСТ на сликите каде што се споменуваат детектираните објекти во референциските наслови за обука на моделот ЕКОЛ-Р. Дополнително го подобруваме нашиот механизам на копија преку Апстрактни етикети, кои го пренесуваат знаењето од познатите на новите типови на објекти, и Морфолошки избор, кој ги одредува соодветните форми на новите етикети на објекти. The resulting model sets new state-of-the-art on the nocaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) and held-out COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016) benchmarks.', 'ml': 'നോവല്\u200d വസ്തുവിന്റെ ക്യാപ്റ്റിങ്ങ് ഒരു ശൂന്യമായ ചിത്രം ക്യാപ്റ്റന്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്ന ജോലിയാണ്. പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ തലക്കെട്ടുകളില്\u200d കാണാത ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് ചിത്രങ്ങളിലുള്ള എല്ലാ നോവല്\u200d വസ്തുക്കളും തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുകയും വിവരിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നതാണ് കീ വി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ വ്യാല്\u200dച്ചലിനെ ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുകയും, നോവല്\u200d വസ്തുക്കളുടെ ലേബുകള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു എസ്സിസിറ്റിയില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ഫ്രെയിമ്പില്\u200d പ്രത്യേക പ്രത്യേക പ്രതിഫല ഫങ്ഷന്\u200d മുഖേന ഇത് നേടിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ശിക്ഷ കൂട്ടുന്നതിന് എക്കോള്\u200d-R മോഡല്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കപ്പെട്ട വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കുന്ന ചിത്രങ്ങളിലേക്ക് എ അബ്രാക്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്റ്റ് ലേബ്ലുകളിലൂടെ നമ്മുടെ പകര്\u200dപ്പ് മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന സാധ്യതകള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നു. അത് നോവല്\u200d വസ്തുക്കളുടെ തരത്ത അതിന്റെ ഫലമായ മോഡല്\u200d നോക്കാപ്പുകളില്\u200d പുതിയ സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് (ആഗ്രാവാല്\u200d എറ്റ് അല്., 2019) നിര്\u200dത്തുന്നു. പിന്നെ ക', 'mt': 'L-Ispeċifikazzjoni tal-Oġġetti Ġodda hija kompitu ta’ Ispeċifikazzjoni tal-Immaġni b’ritratt żero li jeħtieġ li jiġu deskritti oġġetti li ma jidhrux fl-intestaturi tat-taħriġ, iżda li għalihom informazzjoni hija disponibbli minn detetturi esterni tal-oġġetti. L-isfida ewlenija hija li jintgħażlu u jiġu deskritti l-oġġetti ġodda kollha li jinstabu b’saħħithom fl-immaġni tad-dħul. F’dan id-dokument, niffokaw fuq din l-isfida u nipproponu l-mudell ECOL-R (Inkoraġġixxu l-Kopjar tat-Tikketti tal-Oġġetti b’Tagħlim imsaħħa ħ), mudell ta’ trasformatur imsaħħaħ b’kopja li huwa mħeġġeġ biex jiddeskrivi b’mod preċiż it-tikketti tal-oġġetti l-ġodda. Dan jinkiseb permezz ta’ funzjoni speċjalizzata ta’ premju fil-qafas tat-tagħlim ta’ rinfurzar tal-SCST (Rennie et al., 2017) li tinkoraġġixxi msemmija oġġetti ġodda filwaqt li tinżamm il-kwalità tal-intestatura. Aħna nirrestrinġu wkoll it-taħriġ SCST għall-immaġni fejn l-oġġetti identifikati jissemmew f’intestaturi ta’ referenza biex jitħarreġ il-mudell ECOL-R. Barra minn hekk, a ħna ntejbu l-mekkaniżmu ta’ kopja tagħna permezz tat-Tikketti Abstrati, li jittrasferixxu l-għarfien minn tipi magħrufa għal tipi ġodda ta’ oġġetti, u Selettur Morfoloġiku, li jiddetermina l-forom xierqa ta’ tikketti ġodda ta’ oġġetti. Il-mudell li jirriżulta jistabbilixxi punti ta’ riferiment ġodda ta’ aġġornament fuq in-nocaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) u COCO miżmuma (Hendricks et al., 2016).', 'no': 'Novel Object Captioning er eit oppgåve med null-bildet, som krev å skildra objekta som ikkje er sett i opplæringstittelen, men for kva informasjon er tilgjengeleg frå eksterne objektoppdagarar. Nøkkelutfordringen er å velja og beskriva alle salient oppdaga novelobjekt i inndatabiletet. I denne papiret fokuserer vi på denne utfordringen og foreslår ECOL-R-modellen (for å oppretta kopiering av objektmerkelappar med reinstrerte læring), eit kopi-augert transformeringsmodell som er oppretta til å beskrive nøyaktig nye objektmerkelappar. Dette er oppnådd gjennom ein spesialisert rentefunksjon i SCST- utviklingsfunksjonen (Rennie et al., 2017), som oppfordrer novelobjektet som mener medan du held tittelkvaliteten. Vi avgrenserer SCST-opplæringa til bileta der det oppdagte objektet vert menytta i referansoverskrifter for å trenja ECOL-R-modellen. I tillegg forbedrar vi kopimekanismen vårt via abstrakt merkelappar, som overfører kunnskap frå kjente til noverande objekttypar, og ein morfologisk utvalar, som bestemmer dei tilgjengelege utviklingane av novel objektmerkelappar. Dette modellet setter nye kunsttilstanden på noaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) og holdt ut COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016) benchmarken.', 'mn': 'Шинэ объект зураг зураг зураг зураг зураг зураг зураг нь сургуульд харагдахгүй объектийг тайлбарлах шаардлагатай ажил юм. Гэхдээ гадаад объект тогтоогчид ямар мэдээллийг ашиглах вэ? Хамгийн гол сорилт нь оролцох зурагт бүх шинэ объектүүдийг сонгож тайлбарлах ба тайлбарлах юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид энэ сорилт дээр анхаарлаа хандуулж, ECOL-R загварыг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь SCST суралцах үйл ажиллагааны талаар (Rennie et al., 2017) шинэ объект нэр дэвшүүлэхэд зориулагдсан шагналын функц юм. Бид SCST дасгал хөдөлгөөнийг ECOL-R загварын дасгал хөдөлгөөн дээр олон объектуудыг тодорхойлдог зурагт хязгаарладаг. Бид өөрсдийн хуулийн механизмийг Abstract Labels-ээр нэмэгдүүлнэ. Энэ нь мэдлэгийг шинэ объект төрлүүд руу шилжүүлдэг, мөн Морфологик сонгогч. Энэ нь шинэ объект жагсаалтын хэрэгтэй нөлөөлдөг хэлбэрийг тодорхойлж ча Үүний үр дүнтэй загвар нь нокапс (Agrawal et al., 2019) дээр шинэ урлагийн байр суурь болон COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016) салбарт гаргаж байдаг.', 'ro': 'Subtitrarea obiectelor noi este o activitate de subtitrare a imaginii fără înregistrare zero care necesită descrierea obiectelor care nu sunt văzute în subtitrările de instruire, dar pentru care informațiile sunt disponibile de la detectoarele de obiecte externe. Provocarea principală este selectarea și descrierea tuturor obiectelor noi detectate în imaginile de intrare. În această lucrare, ne concentrăm asupra acestei provocări și propunem modelul ECOL-R (Încurajarea copierii etichetelor obiectelor cu învățare consolidată), un model de transformator amplificat de copie care este încurajat să descrie cu exactitate etichetele noilor obiecte. Acest lucru se realizează printr-o funcție specializată de recompensare în cadrul de învățare a consolidării SCST (Rennie et al., 2017), care încurajează mențiunile de obiecte noi, menținând în același timp calitatea subtitrării. Restrângem, de asemenea, instruirea SCST la imaginile în care obiectele detectate sunt menționate în subtitrările de referință pentru instruirea modelului ECOL-R. În plus, îmbunătățim mecanismul nostru de copiere prin intermediul etichetelor abstracte, care transferă cunoștințele de la tipurile de obiecte cunoscute la cele noi, și un selector morfologic, care determină formele corespunzătoare de etichete de obiecte noi. Modelul rezultat stabilește noi standarde de ultimă oră pentru nocaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) și COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016).', 'so': 'Heeganka sawir waa taswir lagu qabsado zero-shot oo ku baahan yahay mid ku qoran alaabta aan lagu arkin tababarka waxbarashada, laakiin macluumaadka waxaa laga helaa macluumaad ka soo jeeda sawirada wax dibadda ah. Caqabadaha muhiimka ah waa in la doorto oo lagu sawiraa dhamaan alaabta sawirada lagu soo bandhigay. Qoraalkan, waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa dhibaatadan, waxaana soo jeedinaynaa modelka ECOL-R (ku qalbi qaboojinta qoraalka alaabta Objects with Reinforced Learning), kaas oo ah model beddelasho oo horumarinaya si saxda ah loo sawiriyo alaabta dhamaadka. Taas waxaa lagu soo bandhigi karaa shaqo mushaar gaar ah oo SCST ku kordhiya iskuulka waxbarashada (Rennie et al., 2017) kaasoo ku dhiirrigeliya macluumaadka dhamaanka marka lagu haysto tusaale ahaan takhasuska waxbarashada. Sidoo kale waxbarashada SCST ayaannu u xadeynaa sawirada laga helo waxyaabaha la arko in lagu baro modelka ECOL-R. Sidoo kale waxaynu kordhinnaa meymikadeenna koobka ah ee ku qoran alaabta Abstract, taasoo aqoonta looga wareejiyaa aqoonta la yaqaan ama noocyada saxda ah, iyo doorasha Morphological, kaas oo go’aaneeya noocyo saxda ah oo ku haboon alaabta dhamaadka. Tusaalada dhamaadka ah ayaa soo saara taariikhda farshaxanka cusub (Agrawal et al., 2019) iyo sidoo kale ku qoran COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016).', 'si': 'Novel object Caption is a zero-shot Picture Caption job that Requires a Description of object not seen in the Training caption, but for what data is Avail from outside object Detectors. යතුරු අවශ්\u200dයය තමයි ඇතුළත් පින්තූරයේ හැම සැලියින්ටම් හොයාගත්ත සැලියින්ටම් පින්තූරයේ ස මේ පැත්තේ, අපි මේ අභ්\u200dයානය සහ ECOL-R මොඩේල් එක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ECOL-R මොඩේල් මේක SCST විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිශේෂිත ප්\u200dරතිශාලයක් විදිහට ලබාගන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා (Rennie et al., 2017) කැප්සන් කුළුවන් ප්\u200dරතිශේෂාවක අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරපු පින්තූරට SCST ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා පින්තූරයෙන් පරීක්ෂණය කරපු පින්තූරයෙන් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා EC අපි සම්පූර්ණයෙන් අපේ ප්\u200dරතිලිපි පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරතිලිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නොකැප්ස් වල අලුත් ස්ථිතිය සැකසුම් කරනවා (Agowal et al., 2019) සහ COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016) බෙන්ච්මාර්ක්ස් වලින්.', 'pl': 'Nowe podpisy obiektów to zadanie zerowe podpisywanie obrazów wymagające opisu obiektów niewidocznych w podpisach szkoleniowych, ale dla których informacje są dostępne z zewnętrznych detektorów obiektów. Kluczowym wyzwaniem jest wybór i opis wszystkich istotnych wykrytych nowych obiektów w obrazach wejściowych. W niniejszym artykule skupiamy się na tym wyzwaniu i proponujemy model ECOL-R (Encouraging Copying of Object Labels with Reinforced Learning), model transformatora rozszerzonego kopiowania, który jest zachęcany do dokładnego opisu nowych etykiet obiektów. Osiąga się to poprzez specjalistyczną funkcję nagród w ramach uczenia się wzmacniającego SCST (Rennie et al., 2017), która zachęca do wzmianek nowych obiektów przy zachowaniu jakości napisów. Ponadto ograniczamy szkolenie SCST do obrazów, gdzie wykryte obiekty są wymienione w podpisach referencyjnych w celu treningu modelu ECOL-R. Dodatkowo ulepszamy nasz mechanizm kopiowania poprzez Abstract Labels, które przenoszą wiedzę ze znanych do nowych typów obiektów, oraz selektor morfologiczny, który określa odpowiednie formy napiętych etykiet nowych obiektów. Powstały model wyznacza nowy state-of-the-art w odniesieniu do nocaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) i wytrzymałych COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016).', 'ta': 'நிலை பொருள் தலைப்பு பொருள் தலைப்புகளில் பார்க்கப்படாத பொருட்களை பூஜ்ஜியமாக்குதல் செயல் விசை சவால் உள்ளீட்டு பிம்பங்களில் கண்டுபிடிக்கப்பட்ட புதிய பொருட்களை தேர்ந்தெடுத்து விவரி இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் இந்த சவால் கவனம் செலுத்தி ECOL-R மாதிரியை (பொருள் விளக்கச்சீட்டை மறுபடியும் கற்றுக்கொண்டு நகலெடுக்கப்பட்ட மாற்று மாதிரி மாதிரியை சரியாக வ SCST குறிப்பிட்ட கூலி செயல்பாட்டின் மூலம் இது செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது. தலைப்பு தரம் வைத்திருக்கும் போது புதிய பொருள் குறிப்புகளை பெறுவதற் We further restrict the SCST training to the images where detected objects are mentioned in reference captions to train the ECOL-R model.  நாம் கூடுதலாக எங்கள் நகல் முறைமையை சுட்டி விளக்கச்சீட்டுகள் மூலம் மேம்படுத்துகிறோம், அது புதிய பொருள் வகைகளிலிருந்து அறிவை மாற்றுகிறது, மற்றும் ஒரு  முடிவு மாதிரி நோக்காப்ஸில் புதிய நிலையான- கலைப்பாட்டை அமைக்கும் நோக்காப்ஸ் (Agrawal et al., 2019) மற்றும் வெளியேற்ற CO (ஹென்ட்ரிக்ஸ', 'sr': 'Kapioniranje novih objekata je zadatak za snimanje slika koji zahteva opisivanje objekata koji nisu viđeni u kapilama obuke, ali za koje su informacije dostupne od detektora vanjskih objekata. Ključni izazov je izabrati i opisati sve salijantne otkrivene nove objekte u slikama ulaska. U ovom papiru, fokusiramo se na taj izazov i predlažemo model ECOL-R (Ukoravajući kopiranje etiketa objekata sa pojačanjem učenja), model transformer a koji je povećan kopijom koji je ohrabren da precizno opiše etikete novih objekata. To je postignuto putem specijalizovane nagrade u okviru učenja SCST-a za pojačanje (Rennie et al., 2017) koji poticava novog objekta spominje pri održavanju kvalitete naslova. Dalje ograničavamo obuku SCST-a na slike gde se spominju otkriveni objekti u referentnim kapilama za obuku modela ECOL-R. Dodatno poboljšamo naš mehanizam kopije putem abstrakta etiketa, koji prenose znanje iz poznatog na nove vrste objekata, i morfološki selektor, koji određuje odgovarajuće uticajne oblike novih etiketa objekata. Rezultatni model postavlja nove stanje umjetnosti na noapama (Agrawal et al., 2019) i održane kriterije COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016).', 'sv': 'Novel Object Captionering är en bildtextningsuppgift som kräver att man beskriver objekt som inte syns i utbildningsbildtexterna, men för vilka information finns tillgänglig från externa objektdetektorer. Den viktigaste utmaningen är att välja och beskriva alla framträdande upptäckta nya objekt i indatabilderna. I denna uppsats fokuserar vi på denna utmaning och föreslår ECOL-R modellen (Uppmuntrande kopiering av objektetiketter med förstärkt lärande), en copy-augmented transformatormodell som uppmuntras att korrekt beskriva de nya objektetiketterna. Detta uppnås via en specialiserad belöningsfunktion i SCST-lärramverket för förstärkning (Rennie et al., 2017) som uppmuntrar nya objektomnämnanden samtidigt som bildtexten bibehålls. Vidare begränsar vi SCST-utbildningen till de bilder där upptäckta objekt nämns i referensbildtexter för att träna ECOL-R-modellen. Dessutom förbättrar vi vår kopieringsmekanism via abstrakta etiketter, som överför kunskap från kända till nya objekttyper, och en morfologisk väljare, som bestämmer lämpliga böjda former av nya objektetiketter. Den resulterande modellen sätter nya toppmoderna riktmärken för nocaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) och uthålliga COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016).', 'ur': 'Novel Object Captioning is a zero-shot Image Captioning task requiring describing objects not seen in the training captions, but for which information is available from external object detectors. Key challenge is to select and describe all salient detected novel objects in the input images. اس کاغذ میں ہم اس چال پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں اور ECOL-R موڈل کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں۔ اسے SCST کی مضبوطی کی تعلیم فرموک میں ایک مخصوص اجرت فعالیت کے ذریعے پہنچایا جاتا ہے (Rennie et al., 2017) جو کاپٹ کی کیفیت حفاظت کی حالت میں نئی چیز کا ذکر کرتا ہے. ہم اس سے زیادہ SCST تطارین کو تصاویروں پر محدود کرتے ہیں جہاں پہچان گئے objectوں کے ذریعہ ECOL-R موڈل کی تطارین کے لئے ذکر کیا جاتا ہے. ہم اضافہ کے ساتھ اپنے کپی مکانیزین کو Abstract Labels کے ذریعہ بہتر کر دیتے ہیں، جو علم کو پہچان کر رہے ہیں تاویل object وں کی طرح سے، اور ایک Morphological Selector، جس نے تاویل objectوں کے مطابق اضافہ کی فرموں کا مقرر کیا ہے. نتیجہ موڈل نے نوکاپ (Agrawal et al., 2019) پر نئی حالت-آرت (هندریکس et al., 2016) بنچمٹ ڈال دی اور COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016) کو پاک رکھا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Name Ushbu qogʻozda, biz bu muammolaga qaramaymiz va ECOL-R modelini (Oʻrganish yordamida obʼekt yozib olish yordamida nusxa olish yordamida yozish modelini aniqlash mumkin. Bu SCST ta'limni o'rganish qatlamni (Rennie et al., 2017) qo'shish imkoniyatini bajarishi mumkin. Bu taʼminlov sifatini davom etishda novel obʼekt taʼminotini foydalanishini foydalanadi. Biz ECOL-R modelini o'rganish uchun kutilgan obʼektlarni SCST ta'minlovchi rasmlariga qaror qilamiz. Biz qo'shilga aytganimizni & # 160; obʼekt turlaridan aniqlanish amalni & # 160; o'zgartirishimiz qo'shiladi. Name", 'vi': 'Tìm kiếm đối tượng tiểu thuyết là một tác vụ chụp ảnh ảnh ảnh ảnh ảnh không có ảnh chụp, đòi hỏi mô tả các đối tượng không thấy trong các câu chuyện huấn luyện, nhưng cho đó có thông tin từ các máy dò đối tượng bên ngoài. Vấn đề chính là phải chọn và miêu tả tất cả các vật thể phát hiện nổi bật trong ảnh nhập. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta tập trung vào thử thách này và đề xuất mô hình của ECL-R (Động lực sao chép các nhãn vật thể với học gia tăng sức ép), một mô hình chuyển hóa có khả năng được khuyến khích mô tả chính xác các nhãn vật thể mới. Việc này được thực hiện qua một chức năng thưởng đặc biệt trong bộ phận học huấn luyện củng cố SCST (Rennie et al., 2007) khuyến khích tên tiểu thuyết nhắc đến trong khi vẫn giữ phẩm chất. Chúng tôi còn hạn chế đào tạo SCST với những hình ảnh nơi phát hiện vật thể được đề cập trong các dòng chỉ dẫn để đào tạo mô hình ECL-R. Chúng tôi còn cải tiến cơ chế bản sao bằng những Bản sao, mà truyền kiến thức từ các loại đối tượng mới được biết, và một bộ chọn Morphological, which determine the appropriate Dạng thức thích hợp của các nhãn vật thể mới. Kết quả của mô hình cho thấy những màn đêm cực kỳ mới (Agrawal et al., 2009) và một chất lượng CO2 dự trữ (Hendricks et al., 2006) tiêu chuẩn.', 'da': 'Novel Object Captionering er en billedtekstopgave uden billeder, der kræver at beskrive objekter, der ikke ses i træningsbilledteksterne, men for hvilke der findes oplysninger fra eksterne objektdetektorer. Den vigtigste udfordring er at vælge og beskrive alle fremtrædende detekterede nye objekter i input billederne. I denne artikel fokuserer vi på denne udfordring og foreslår ECOL-R modellen (Incoraggiang Copying of Object Labels with Reinforced Learning), en copy-augmented transformer model, der opfordres til nøjagtigt at beskrive de nye objektetiketter. Dette opnås via en specialiseret belønningsfunktion i SCST forstærkning learning framework (Rennie et al., 2017), der tilskynder til nye objektomtaler, samtidig med at billedteksterne opretholdes. Vi begrænser endvidere SCST-træningen til de billeder, hvor detekterede objekter er nævnt i referencebilledtekster for at træne ECOL-R modellen. Vi forbedrer desuden vores kopieringsmekanisme via Abstrakte Labels, som overfører viden fra kendte til nye objekttyper, og en morfologisk Selector, der bestemmer de relevante bøjede former for nye objektetiketter. Den resulterende model sætter nye state-of-the-art på nocaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) og holdt-out COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016) benchmarks.', 'nl': 'Nieuwe objectondertiteling is een taak voor afbeeldingsondertiteling waarbij objecten worden beschreven die niet in de trainingsondertiteling worden gezien, maar waarvoor informatie beschikbaar is via externe objectdetectors. De belangrijkste uitdaging is om alle opvallende gedetecteerde nieuwe objecten in de invoerbeelden te selecteren en te beschrijven. In dit artikel concentreren we ons op deze uitdaging en stellen we het ECOL-R model voor (Encouraging Copying of Object Labels with Reinforced Learning), een copy-augmented transformator model dat wordt aangemoedigd om de nieuwe objectlabels nauwkeurig te beschrijven. Dit wordt bereikt door middel van een gespecialiseerde beloningsfunctie in het SCST versterking learning framework (Rennie et al., 2017) dat het vermelden van nieuwe objecten aanmoedigt met behoud van de kwaliteit van de ondertiteling. We beperken de SCST training verder tot de beelden waar gedetecteerde objecten worden vermeld in referentiebijschriften om het ECOL-R model te trainen. Daarnaast verbeteren we ons kopieermechanisme via Abstract Labels, die kennis overdragen van bekende naar nieuwe objecttypes, en een Morphologische Selector, die de juiste geïnfecteerde vormen van nieuwe objectlabels bepaalt. Het resulterende model zet nieuwe state-of-the-art benchmarks op de nocaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) en vastgehouden COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016).', 'de': 'Novel Object Captioning ist eine Aufgabe zur Bildbeschriftung ohne Aufnahme, bei der Objekte beschrieben werden müssen, die nicht in den Trainingsbeschriftungen zu sehen sind, für die aber Informationen von externen Objektdetektoren verfügbar sind. Die zentrale Herausforderung besteht darin, alle auffälligen entdeckten neuen Objekte in den Eingabebildern auszuwählen und zu beschreiben. In diesem Beitrag konzentrieren wir uns auf diese Herausforderung und schlagen das ECOL-R-Modell (Encouraging Copying of Object Labels with Reinforced Learning) vor, ein copy-augmented Transformator-Modell, das ermutigt wird, die neuartigen Objektbeschriftungen genau zu beschreiben. Dies wird durch eine spezielle Belohnungsfunktion im SCST Enhancement Learning Framework (Rennie et al., 2017) erreicht, die die Erwähnung neuer Objekte fördert und gleichzeitig die Qualität der Untertitel beibehält. Darüber hinaus beschränken wir das SCST-Training auf Bilder, bei denen erkannte Objekte in Referenzbeschriftungen erwähnt werden, um das ECOL-R-Modell zu trainieren. Zusätzlich verbessern wir unseren Kopiermechanismus durch Abstract Labels, die Wissen von bekannten auf neuartige Objekttypen übertragen, und einen Morphologischen Selektor, der die passenden gebeugten Formen von neuartigen Objektbeschriftungen bestimmt. Das daraus resultierende Modell setzt neue Maßstäbe für die Nocaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) und die COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016).', 'hr': 'Novi objekt je zadatak za snimanje slika koji zahtijeva opisivanje objekata koji nisu vidjeli u okviru obuke, već za koje su informacije dostupne od detektora vanjskih objekata. Ključni izazov je izabrati i opisati sve salijantne otkrivene nove objekte u ulaznim slikama. U ovom papiru, usredotočili smo se na taj izazov i predlažemo model ECOL-R (Ukoravajući kopiranje etiketa objekata s pojačanjem učenja), model transformatora koji je povećan kopijom koji je potaknut to čno opisati etikete novih objekata. To se postigne putem specijalizirane funkcije nagrade u okviru učenja pojačanja SCST-a (Rennie et al., 2017) koja poticava nov objekt spominje dok održava kvalitet naslova. Dalje ograničavamo obuku SCST-a na slike gdje se nalazi objekti spominju u referentnim navodima kako bi obučili model ECOL-R. Osim toga, poboljšamo naš mehanizam kopije putem apstrakta etiketa, koji prenose znanje iz poznatog na nove vrste objekata, i morfološki selektor, koji određuje odgovarajuće utjecene oblike novih etiketa objekata. Rezultatni model postavlja nove stanje umjetnosti na noaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) i održane kriterije COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016).', 'bg': 'Нов обект надпис е задача за нулев изстрел на изображение, изискваща описване на обекти, които не се виждат в тренировъчните надписи, но за които има информация от външни детектори на обекти. Ключовото предизвикателство е да изберете и опишете всички видни открити нови обекти в входните изображения. В настоящата статия ние се фокусираме върху това предизвикателство и предлагаме модела Насърчаване на копирането на етикети на обекти с подсилено учене), модел трансформатор, който се насърчава да опише точно новите етикети на обекти. Това се постига чрез специализирана функция за възнаграждение в рамката за обучение за подсилване на SCST (Рени и др., 2017), която насърчава споменаването на нови обекти, като същевременно поддържа качеството на надписите. Освен това ограничаваме обучението до изображенията, където откритите обекти са споменати в справочните надписи за обучение на модела. Освен това подобряваме нашия механизъм за копиране чрез Абстрактни етикети, които прехвърлят знания от известни към нови типове обекти, и морфологичен селектор, който определя подходящите наклонени форми на нови етикети на обекти. Полученият модел определя нови съвременни показатели за нокапс (Агравал и др., 2019 г.) и проведените COCO (Хендрикс и др., 2016 г.).', 'ko': '새로운 물체 자막은 제로 렌즈 이미지 자막 작업으로 자막에서 볼 수 없는 물체를 훈련시켜 달라고 요구하지만 외부 물체 탐지기로부터 정보를 얻을 수 있다.관건적인 도전은 입력 이미지에서 현저하게 검출된 모든 새로운 대상을 선택하고 설명하는 것이다.본고에서 우리는 이 도전에 주목하고 ECOL-R모델(강화학습을 통해 복제 대상 라벨을 장려)을 제시했다. 이것은 복제 강화된 변환기 모델로 새로운 대상 라벨을 정확하게 묘사하도록 장려한다.SCST 강화학습 프레임워크(Rennie et al., 2017)의 전문 인센티브 기능을 통해 이뤄진 것으로, 이 프레임워크는 자막의 질을 유지하면서 새로운 대상을 언급하도록 권장한다.더 나아가 SCST 훈련을 ECOL-R 모델을 훈련하기 위해 자막에 검사 대상을 언급한 이미지에 제한했다.또한 추상적인 라벨(지식을 이미 알고 있는 대상 유형에서 새로운 대상 유형으로 옮기는 것)과 형태 선택기(새로운 대상 라벨의 적당한 굴절 형식을 확정하는 것)를 통해 복제 메커니즘을 개선한다.이에 따른 모델은 노캡스(Agrawal 등·2019년)와 코코(Hendricks 등·2016년)에 새로운 최신 수준을 설정했다.', 'id': 'Captioning Objek Novel adalah tugas Captioning Gambar tanpa gambar yang membutuhkan deskripsi objek yang tidak terlihat dalam captions latihan, tetapi informasi yang tersedia dari detektor objek eksternal. Tantangan kunci adalah untuk memilih dan menggambarkan semua objek baru yang terdeteksi yang salin dalam gambar masukan. Dalam kertas ini, kami fokus pada tantangan ini dan mengusulkan model ECOL-R (Encouraging Copying of Object Labels with Reinforced Learning), model transformer yang ditambah salinan yang didorong untuk menjelaskan dengan akurat label objek baru. Hal ini dicapai melalui fungsi hadiah khusus dalam cadangan pembelajaran SCST reinforcement (Rennie et al., 2017) yang mendorong objek baru menyebutkan sementara mempertahankan kualitas tajuk. Kami lebih lanjut membatasi pelatihan SCST untuk gambar di mana objek terdeteksi disebutkan dalam catatan referensi untuk melatih model ECOL-R. We additionally improve our copy mechanism via Abstract Labels, which transfer knowledge from known to novel object types, and a Morphological Selector, which determines the appropriate inflected forms of novel object labels.  Model hasilnya menetapkan standar terbaru pada nocaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) dan COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016) yang ditahan.', 'sw': 'Toleleo la Sayansi ni kazi ya kuchukua picha sifuri inayohitaji kuelezea vitu ambavyo havionekani katika maeneo ya mafunzo, lakini ambavyo taarifa zinapatikana kutoka kwa wateja wa nje wa vitu. Changamoto muhimu ni kuchagua na kuelezea vitu vyote vilivyogunduliwa vya riwaya katika picha za input. Katika gazeti hili, tunalenga kwenye changamoto hili na tunapendekeza modeli ya ECOL-R (Kuhamasisha Kufuatilia Taarifa za Objects na Kufundisha Mabadiliko, modeli ya mabadiliko yanayoongezwa kwa nusura ambayo inahamasishwa kuelezea vigezo vya habari vya riwaya. Hii imefanikiwa kwa njia ya kazi maalum ya malipo katika mfumo wa kujifunza SCST unaoongeza msingi wa kujifunza (Rennie et al., 2017) unaohamasisha tajwa la vifaa vya kitaifa wakati wa kuendelea sifa hizo. Tunawazuia mafunzo ya SCST kwa picha ambazo vitu vilivyogunduliwa vimetajwa katika vichwa vya maoni ili kufundisha muundo wa ECOL-R. We additionally improve our copy mechanism via Abstract Labels, which transfer knowledge from known to novel object types, and a Morphological Selector, which determines the appropriate inflected forms of novel object labels.  Mradi wa matokeo unatengeneza hali mpya ya sanaa kwenye vituo vya habari (Agrawal et al., 2019) na utaratibu wa CO (Hendricks et al., 2016) uliofanyika.', 'tr': 'Taze zady käpşendirmek 0-resim Resim Käpşendirmek zady okuw käpşenlerde görülmeýän zadlary tassyklamak gerek, ýöne daşarydaky zadyň detektoryndan hem maglumat bar. Açmak kynçysy girdi suratlarynda ähli salient aňladan täze zady saýlamak we tassyklamak. Bu kagyzda biz bu kynçylyka üns berip, ECOL-R nusgasyny teklip edip, taýýarlanmak üçin nusgasyny gollaýarys. Bu SCST öwrenme frameworkynda (Rennie et al., 2017) täze zady kafdalyk taýýarlanan täze täzelikleri bilen ýeňildi. ECOL-R modelini öwrenmek üçin tapylan zadlary diýip ýazylýan suratlara daşyrýarys. Biz hem Abstrakt Etiketleri bilen tanyş zadyň türlerine, we Morpholojik Saýlawçy bilen täsirli täsirli nusgalaryň şeklini bejerýäris. netijeli model nocaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) we COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016) kriteriýasynda täze sanat taýýarlanýar.', 'fa': 'کاپیتان شیء نوئل یک کار کاپیتان تصویر صفر تصویر است که نیاز دارد توصیف شیوه\u200cها را در عنوان تمرین نمی\u200cبینند، بلکه برای کدام اطلاعات از بازرسان شیوه خارجی دسترسی دارد. چالش کلید این است که همه اشیاء رمانی را در تصاویر وارد انتخاب و توصیف کنید. در این کاغذ، ما روی این چالش تمرکز می\u200cکنیم و مدل ECOL-R را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم (تشکیل کردن کپی کردن نقاشی\u200cهای نقاشی با یادگیری استوار) یک مدل تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cی کپی افزایش شده که به دقیق توصیف نقاشی\u200cهای نقاشی است. این از طریق یک کار پاداش متخصص در چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچ ما بیشتر آموزش SCST را به تصاویر محدود می کنیم که اشیاء شناسایی در عنوان مربوط به آموزش مدل ECOL-R اشاره می کنند. اضافه ما مکانیسم کپی خود را از طریق برچسب\u200cهای ابستراک بهتر می\u200cکنیم، که علم را از شناخته شده به نوع شیء\u200cها و یک برچسب مورفولوژیک، که فرم\u200cهای تاثیرگذاری مناسب از برچسب\u200cهای شیء\u200cهای نو را تعیین می\u200cکند. مدل نتیجه\u200cای از آن بر نوکاپ (Agrawal et al., 2019) و COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016) سنجیره\u200cهای جدید را تنظیم می\u200cکند.', 'am': 'ቦታ የቁልፍ ምርጫዎች በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የዚህን ጥቃት ላይ እናስማማታለን እና የECOL-R ሞዴል (የዕቃ ምልክቶችን ቅጂ በመቀነስ ማስተማር እናበረታታለን), የቅጂ-አረንጓዴ አካባቢ ምልክቶችን በትክክል ለመዘርጋት የሚሞክረው የቅጂ አካባቢ ምልክቶችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ይህ የSCST ትምህርት ፍሬም (Rennie et al., 2017) በመጠቀም የአሁኑን አካባቢ ጥሩ በመጠበቅ ጊዜ የረኀብ አካባቢ ማስታወቂያውን የሚያበረታ ነው፡፡ ECOL-R ሞዴል ለማስተማርና የተገኘውን አካባቢዎች በሚታወሱበት ምስሎች ላይ SCST ማስተማርን ጨምረናል፡፡ አካባቢ አካባቢ እናሳድጋለን፡፡ ምሳሌው አዲስ የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-አካል (አግራwal et al., 2019) እና የCO (Hendricks et al., 2016) መለያ ገጾችን ያስተካክላል፡፡', 'sq': 'Kapitullimi i Objektit të Ri është një detyrë zero-shot Captioning Images që kërkon përshkrimin e objekteve që nuk janë parë në titujt e stërvitjes, por për të cilat informacioni është në dispozicion nga detektorët e jashtëm të objekteve. Sfida kryesore është zgjedhja dhe përshkrimi i të gjitha objekteve të shquara të reja të zbuluara në imazhet e hyrjes. In this paper, we focus on this challenge and propose the ECOL-R model (Encouraging Copying of Object Labels with Reinforced Learning), a copy-augmented transformer model that is encouraged to accurately describe the novel object labels.  Kjo arrihet nëpërmjet një funksioni shpërblimi të specializuar në kuadrin e mësimit të forcimit të SCST (Rennie et al., 2017) që inkurajon përmendimet e objekteve të reja duke mbajtur kualitetin e titullit. We further restrict the SCST training to the images where detected objects are mentioned in reference captions to train the ECOL-R model.  Përveç kësaj përmirësojmë mekanizmin tonë kopje nëpërmjet Labeleve Abstrakte, që transferojnë njohuritë nga tipat e njohur për objekte të reja, dhe një zgjedhës morfologjik, i cili përcakton forma të përshtatshme të dhëna të etiketave të objekteve të reja. Modeli përfundimtar vendos nivele të reja të teknologjisë në pikat e noapsit (Agrawal et al., 2019) dhe pikat e COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016).', 'af': "Novel Objekte Captioning is 'n zero- shot Beeld Captioning taak wat benodig beskrywing van voorwerpe nie gesien in die onderwerp titels nie, maar vir wat inligting is beskikbaar van eksterne voorwerp detektors. Die sleutel uitdrukking is om alle salient gevind novele objekte in die invoer beelde te kies en beskrywe. In hierdie papier, ons fokus op hierdie uitdrukking en voorstel die ECOL-R model (Verskaffing Kopiering van Objekte etikette met reinversterkte Leer), â\x80\x99n kopie-vergroot transformeermodel wat is aanbevestig om die novele voorwerp etikette te beskryf. Hierdie is bereik deur 'n spesialiseerde vergelde funksie in die SCST versterking leer raamwerk (Rennie et al., 2017) wat versterk novel voorwerp verteenwoordig terwyl die titel kwaliteit onderhou. Ons verder beperk die SCST-oefening na die beelde waar gevinde voorwerpe in verwysing titels ingemenem word om die ECOL-R model te trein. Ons verbeter ons kopie mekanisme deur abstrakte etikette, wat kennis van bekend na novele voorwerp tipes oordra, en 'n Morfologiese Kieser, wat bepaal die geskikte inflekke vorms van novele voorwerp etikette. Die resulteerde model stel nuwe staat-van-kuns op die nocaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) en hou-uit Koko (Hendricks et al., 2016) benchmarke.", 'hy': 'Նոր օբյեկտների գլխավորումը զրոյական նկարների գլխավորումն է, որը պահանջում է օբյեկտներ նկարագրել, որոնք չեն տեսնում մարզի գլխավորումներում, բայց որոնց համար տեղեկատվությունը հասանելի է արտաքին օբյեկտների դետեկտորներից Հիմնական մարտահրավերն այն է, որ ընտրենք և նկարագրենք բոլոր արտահայտված նոր օբյեկտները ներմուծման պատկերներում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք կենտրոնանում ենք այս մարտահրավերի վրա և առաջարկում ենք "ԷԿՕԼ-Ռ" մոդելը, որը խրախուսում է ճշգրիտ նկարագրել նոր օբյեկտների պիտակները: Սա հասնում է մասնագիտական վարձի ֆունկցիայի միջոցով ՍՍԹ-ի ուժեղացման ուսուցման շրջանակում (Ռենի և այլն., 2017), որը խրախուսում է նոր օբյեկտների նշումները, մինչդեռ պահպանում է վերնագրի որակը: Մենք նաև սահմանափակում ենք ՍՍԹ-ի ուսումնասիրությունը միայն այն նկարներին, որտեղ հայտնաբերված օբյեկտները նշումն են առկա վերնագրերում, որպեսզի ուսումնասիրեն ԷԿՕԼ-Ռ մոդել Մենք նաև բարելավում ենք մեր կոպիայի մեխանիզմը Աբստրակտ Լեյթերի միջոցով, որը տեղափոխում է գիտելիքը հայտնի նոր օբյեկտների տեսակներից և մորֆոլոգիական ընտրողի միջոցով, որը որոշում է նոր օբյեկտների պիտակների համապատասխան ազդե Արդյունքում ստացված մոդելը նոր տեխնոլոգիաներ է սահմանում Նոկապսի (Agrewal et al., 2019) և COCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCO', 'bn': 'Novel Object Captioning is a zero-shot Image Captioning task requiring describing objects not seen in the training captions, but for which information is available from external object detectors.  মূল চ্যালেঞ্জ হল ইনপুটের ছবিতে সকল স্বাভাবিক উপনীত বস্তুকে নির্বাচন এবং বর্ণনা করার জন্য। এই পত্রিকায় আমরা এই চ্যালেঞ্জের দিকে মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি এবং ইকোএল-আর মডেল প্রস্তাব করি (অবজেক্ট লেবেলের সাথে পুনরায় শিক্ষা দিয়ে অনুপ্রাণিত করার উদ্দেশ্যে অনুপ্রাণিত হচ্ছে), একটি ক এসসিসিটি শিক্ষা ফ্রেমের (রেনি এন্ট আল ২০১৭) বিশেষ পুরস্কারের কাজের মাধ্যমে এটি অর্জন করা হয়েছে যা শিক্ষা কার্যক্রমের ক্ষেত্রে নোভেল বস্ত আমরা এসসিসিটি প্রশিক্ষণের প্রশিক্ষণ আরো সীমাবদ্ধ করে দিয়েছি যেখানে আবিষ্কার করা বস্তুকে উল্লেখ করা হয়েছে তারা ইকোল-আর মড আমরা এছাড়াও আমাদের কপি মেক্সিমেন্ট বেলের মাধ্যমে উন্নত করি, যা পরিচিত নতুন বস্তুর ধরন থেকে জ্ঞান পরিবর্তন করা হয়েছে এবং একটি মরোফোলিক্যাল নির্বাচনী, যা সঠিক প্রভা ফলাফলের মডেলটি নোকাপের নতুন রাষ্ট্রীয় শিল্পের অবস্থা (আগরাওয়াল এন্ট আল, ২০১৯) এবং সিকোর (হেন্ড্রিক্স এন্ট এল, ২০১৬) বেনমার্ক নিয়েছে।', 'az': 'Novel Object Captioning sıfır-shot Rəsm Captioning işidir, təhsil nömrələrində görmədikləri şeyləri tanımlamaq istəyir, lakin hansı məlumat dış objektlər detektorlarından faydalanır. Anahtar çətinlikləri girdi şəkillərində bütün salient keşirilmiş yeni objekləri seçmək və tanımlamaqdır. Bu kağızda, biz bu çətinliklərə odaklanır və yeni objek etiketlərini doğrudan təsdiqləmək üçün ECOL-R modelini təklif edirik. Bu, SCST öyrənmə framework ü (Rennie et al., 2017) içində xüsusiyyətli mükafat funksiyası vasitəsilə başa çatdırılır. Bu, yeni objek yazıldığını söyləyərək başlıq keyfiyyətini qoruyub saxlayar. Biz də SCST təhsilini ECOL-R modelini təhsil etmək üçün tanınmış objeklərin yada edildiyi şəkillərə qurtarıq. Əvvəlcə bizim kopyalama mehanizmimizi Abstract Labels vasitəsilə yaxşılaşdırırıq, bu elmi yeni objektlər türünə və Morphological Seçici ilə dəyişdirir ki, yeni objektlər etiketlərinin uyğun təsirli formlarını müəyyən edir. Növbəti modellər nocaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) və COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016) müəyyən etiketlərində yeni məlumatı təyin edir.', 'bs': 'Kapioniranje novih objekata je zadatak za snimanje slika koji zahtijeva opisivanje objekata koji nisu viđeni u okviru obuke, već za koje su informacije dostupne od detektora vanjskih objekata. Ključni izazov je izabrati i opisati sve salijante otkrivene nove objekte u slikama ulaska. U ovom papiru, fokusiramo se na taj izazov i predlažemo model ECOL-R (Ukoravajući kopiranje etiketa objekata sa pojačanom učenjem), model transformer a koji je povećan kopijom koji je potaknut da precizno opiše etikete novih objekata. To se postigne putem specijalizirane nagrade funkcije u okviru učenja SCST-a za pojačanje učenja (Rennie et al., 2017) koja poticava novog objekta spominje u održavanju kvalitete naslova. Dalje ograničavamo obuku SCST-a na slike gdje se spominju otkriveni objekti u referentnim kapilama za obuku modela ECOL-R. Osim toga, poboljšamo naš mehanizam kopije putem abstrakta etiketa, koji prenose znanje iz poznatog na nove vrste objekata, i morfološki selektor, koji određuje odgovarajuće uticajene oblike novih etiketa objekata. Rezultatni model postavlja nove stanje umjetnosti na noaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) i održane kriterije COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016).', 'ca': "Novel Object Captioning és una tasca zero de Captioning d'imatges que requereix descriure objectes no vists en els títulos d'entrenament, però per a les quals hi ha informació disponible dels detectors externs d'objectes. El repte clau és seleccionar i descriure tots els objectes noves detectats salients a les imatges d'entrada. En aquest article, ens centrem en aquest repte i proposem el model ECOL-R (Encorajar la Copia d'Etiquetes d'Objectes amb Aprendiment Reforcat), un model de transformador augmentat amb còpia que està encoratjat a descriure exactament les etiquetes d'objectes noves. Això es pot aconseguir a través d'una funció de recompensa especialitzada en el marc d'aprenentatge de reforç SCST (Rennie et al., 2017) que estimula a mencionar objectes noves mentre manté la qualitat del títol. Restricim més l'entrenament SCST a les imatges on es mencionen els objectes detectats en títulos de referència per entrenar el model ECOL-R. També millorem el nostre mecanisme de còpia a través d'Etiquetes Abstractes, que transfereixen coneixements de tipus coneguts a tipus d'objectes noves, i un Selector Morfològic, que determina les formes adequades influïdes d'etiquetes noves d'objectes. The resulting model sets new state-of-the-art on the nocaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) and held-out COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016) benchmarks.", 'cs': 'Nové popisky objektů jsou úloha vyžadující popis objektů, které nejsou viděny v titulcích školení, ale pro který jsou k dispozici informace z externích detektorů objektů. Klíčovou výzvou je vybrat a popsat všechny významné detekované nové objekty ve vstupních snímkech. V tomto článku se zaměřujeme na tuto výzvu a navrhujeme model ECOL-R (Povzbuzující kopírování objektových štítků s zesíleným učením), model transformátoru s rozšířeným kopírováním, který je podporován k přesnému popisu nových popisů objektů. Toho je dosaženo prostřednictvím specializované funkce odměny v rámci SCST zesílení učení (Rennie et al., 2017), která podporuje zmínky nových objektů při zachování kvality titulků. Dále omezujeme SCST trénink na snímky, kde jsou detekované objekty zmíněny v referenčních titulcích pro trénink modelu ECOL-R. Náš kopírovací mechanismus navíc zlepšujeme prostřednictvím Abstraktních štítků, které přenášejí znalosti ze známých na nové typy objektů, a morfologického selektoru, který určuje vhodné zkloněné formy nových objektů štítků. Výsledný model nastavuje nové nejmodernější měřítka na nokapsy (Agrawal et al., 2019) a vydržené COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016).', 'fi': 'Novel Object Captioning on nollakuvaustehtävä, jossa kuvataan objekteja, joita ei näy harjoituskuvateksteissä, mutta joista on saatavilla tietoja ulkoisista objektitunnistimista. Keskeisenä haasteena on valita ja kuvata kaikki tärkeät havaitut uudet esineet syötekuvissa. Tässä artikkelissa keskitymme tähän haasteeseen ja ehdotamme ECOL-R-mallia (Encouraging Copying of Object Labels with Reforçed Learning), kopiolla lisättyä muuntajamallia, jota kannustetaan kuvaamaan tarkasti uusia objektitarroja. Tämä saavutetaan SCST-vahvistuksen oppimiskehyksessä (Rennie et al., 2017) olevalla erityisellä palkitsemistoiminnolla, joka kannustaa uusia objekteja mainitsemaan samalla kuvatekstin laadun. Rajoitamme SCST-koulutuksen myös kuviin, joissa havaitut esineet mainitaan viittauksissa ECOL-R-mallin kouluttamiseksi. Lisäksi parannamme kopiointimekanismiamme Abstract Labels -työkaluilla, jotka siirtävät tietoa tunnetuista objektityypeistä uusiin, sekä Morfologisella valitsimella, joka määrittää uusien objektitunnisteiden oikeat taivutetut muodot. Tuloksena olevassa mallissa asetetaan uudet nocaps-vertailuarvot (Agrawal et al., 2019) ja COCO-vertailuarvot (Hendricks et al., 2016).', 'et': 'Uudse objekti pildistamine on nullpiltreerimise ülesanne, mis nõuab objektide kirjeldamist, mida ei ole treeningu pealdistes nähtud, kuid mille kohta on teave kättesaadav välistest objektidetektoritest. Peamine väljakutse on valida ja kirjeldada kõiki olulisi avastatud uudseid objekte sisendpiltidel. Käesolevas töös keskendume sellele väljakutsele ja pakume välja ECOL-R mudeli (Objektimärgiste kopeerimise ergutamine tugevdatud õppega), mis on koopialisandiga trafo mudel, mida julgustatakse täpselt kirjeldama uudseid objektimärgiseid. See saavutatakse SCST tugevdamise õpperaamistikus spetsialiseerunud preemiafunktsiooni kaudu (Rennie et al., 2017), mis julgustab uudseid objekte mainima, säilitades samas pealdise kvaliteedi. Lisaks piirame SCST-koolitust piltidega, kus ECOL-R mudeli treenimiseks on märgitud tuvastatud objekte. Lisaks täiustame oma kopeerimismehhanismi abstraktsete siltide abil, mis edastavad teadmisi tuntud objektitüüpidest uudsetele objektitüüpidele, ja morfoloogilise valija abil, mis määrab kindlaks uudsete objektimärgiste sobivad paindlikud vormid. Saadud mudelis kehtestatakse nocapsi (Agrawal et al., 2019) ja COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016) võrdlusnäitajate uued tasemed.', 'jv': 'New politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang pepulan iki, kita dipunduh nggunakake nung akeh lan padha model cor-R (engasun nggawe barang nggawe Object Label karo Rebungke Learning), model sing nambah-ogmented transformer padha iki dadi bisa isih akeh nggawe barang Object Label Iki iso nggawe barang nggambar aturan gawang nggawe luwih dumadhi kanggo nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe gantiné (Reni et al, 1997) sing ngubah batasan obyek sing dumadhi kapan-kapan. Awak dhéwé nggawe luwih dumadhi CURT luwih nggawe gambar neng penting ing ing buturan Obyek sing ditambah barang nggawe barang nggawe modèl ESOl-R Awak dhéwé nambah dhéwé ngerasakno pergambar ngéwé ngerasakno absolute Label, sing nyimpen ngerwih kuwi kesempatan kanggo ngerasakno karo nganggo nyapaké object, lan kebebasan MOphologi, sing ujaran akeh efet pergambar efet karo nganggo alam sing gawé Ndoleh sing wis ditambah sistem sing dibutur-sistem sing gawe lompok nggawe noaps (AWAl et al, 2011) lan nganggo iso nggawe barang-sistem sing berarti (hendercks et al, 2011).', 'sk': 'Nove napise predmeta je opravilo brez posnetkov slike, ki zahteva opis predmetov, ki niso videni v napisih usposabljanja, za katere so na voljo informacije iz zunanjih detektorjev predmetov. Ključni izziv je izbrati in opisati vse pomembne zaznane nove predmete v vhodnih slikah. V prispevku se osredotočamo na ta izziv in predlagamo model ECOL-R (Spodbujanje kopiranja nalepk predmetov z ojačanim učenjem), model transformatorjev s kopijo povečanega, ki ga spodbuja k natančnemu opisu novih nalepk predmetov. To dosežemo s specializirano funkcijo nagrajevanja v okviru učenja za ojačanje SCST (Rennie et al., 2017), ki spodbuja omenjanje novih predmetov, hkrati pa ohranja kakovost napisa. Nadalje omejujemo usposabljanje SCST na slike, kjer so zaznani predmeti omenjeni v referenčnih napisih za usposabljanje modela ECOL-R. Dodatno izboljšujemo naš kopirni mehanizem prek Abstract Labels, ki prenašajo znanje iz znanih v nove vrste objektov, in morfološkega selektorja, ki določa ustrezne upognjene oblike nalepk novih objektov. Nastali model določa nove najsodobnejše vrednosti referenčnih vrednosti nocaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) in COCO (Hendricks et al., 2016).', 'ha': "Shirin Hana abu na Non Babba yana da wani tashi na sifire-shot, Sura na ƙayyade abun da yana son faɗa ɗa abubuwa wanda ba a gane shi ba cikin tsarin mafarin aiki, amma don a sami tsarin da za'a iya amfani da maɓallin abun baka. Kiɓall in key is to select and describe duk abubuwa da aka gane na nohannu cikin zanen inputi. Daga wannan takardar, munã fokusar da wannan tsutarwa kuma tuna buƙata misalin ECOL-R (Yaƙarfafa Kyaufe wa Label na Label da Ana Shirin da Haƙĩri da Lõkaci), wata motel na-da aka ƙara kofi-augmentin transformation da ake yarda da ya bayyana alama abun kwanan. Wannan ana samar da wani aikin ijãra mai ƙayyadadde a cikin SSAT, yana ƙara firam na karantawa (renni et al., 2017) wanda ke ƙarfafa sunan abun yanzu a lokacin da ke tsari tsarin sunan. Tuna kodi kodi tsarin SCOT zuwa zanen zane da aka ambaci abubuwa da aka gane su a cikin sunan mafaka dõmin ya sanar da misalin ECOL-R. Tuna samar da kanuni kofi game da Label na Wasu'a, wanda ke shige ilmi daga tsarin abun nan zuwa abun yanzu, da wata Zaɓen Mamorfologi, wanda ke ƙunsa da tsarin abun da aka ƙayyade masu inganci da aka sani na yanzu. Babu motsi na daidaita halin-sanar kan nocaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) kuma ya sami-durowa COCO (henrikks et al., 2016).", 'bo': 'Novel Object Captioning is a zero-shot Image Captioning task requiring describing objects not seen in the training captions, but for which information is available from external object detectors. གལ་ཆེན་དག་ཆེ་ཆུང་དེ་གདམ་པ་དང་ནང་འཇུག་བརྙན་རིས་ནང་གི་སྙན་སྣོད་རྣམ་གྲངས་རྙེད་དུ་བཤད་དགོས In this paper, we focus on this challenge and propose the ECOL-R model (Encouraging Copying of Object Labels with Reinforced Learning), a copy-augmented transformer model that is encouraged to accurately describe the novel object labels. འདི་ནི་SCST(Rennie et al., 2017)ནང་གི་ཁྱད་དུ་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཅན་གྱི་ལས་འགན་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཤོག་བྱས་པ་ཞིག་ཏུ་འཇོག་རྒྱུ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་རྟོགས་པའི་དངོས་པོ་ཚོའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་བརྙན་རིས་ལ་སྒྲིག་ཐད་ཚད་ཕར་ཚད་ལྡན་ཡོད། We additionally improve our copy mechanism via Abstract Labels, which transfer knowledge from known to novel object types, and a Morphological Selector, which determines the appropriate inflected forms of novel object labels. གཟུགས་འགྲུལ་པའི་མིག་ཆས་གསར་བ་དེ་nocaps (Agrawal et al., 2019) ལ་ཉར་འཇོག་པའི་མཐོང་སྣང་གསར་བ་གཞི་སྒྲིག་ཡོད།', 'he': 'כיתוב אובייקט חדש הוא משימה כיתוב תמונות ללא צילומים שדורשת תיאור אובייקטים שלא נראים בכותבים האימונים, אלא עבור מה מידע זמין מגליטי אובייקטים חיצוניים. The key challenge is to select and describe all salient detected novel objects in the input images.  בעיתון הזה, אנו מתמקדים באתגר הזה ומציעים את דוגמא ECOL-R (מעודד העתק של תוויות אובייקטים עם לימוד מאושר), דוגמא משתנה שמעודדת לתאר בדיוק את תוויות האובייקטים החדשים. זה מושג באמצעות תפקיד פרס מומחה במסגרת הלימודים של התגבורת SCST (Rennie et al., 2017) שמעודד אובייקט חדש מזכיר בזמן שמשמר את איכות הכותרת. אנו מוגבלים יותר את האימונים של SCST לתמונות שבו אובייקטים שנמצאים נזכרים בשותפים התייחסות לאימונים של מודל ECOL-R. בנוסף, אנחנו משתפרים את מנגנון העתק שלנו באמצעות תוויות אבסטרט, אשר מעביר ידע מסוגי אובייקטים ידועים לסוגי אובייקטים חדשים, ובחיר מורפולוגי, אשר קובע את צורות הנכונות של תוויות אובייקטים חדשים. הדוגמא הנוצאה מכניסה את המצב החדש של האומנות על נקפסים (Agrawal et al., 2019) ומחזיקים את קוקו (Hendricks et al., 2016).'}
{'en': 'Debiasing Pre-trained Contextualised Embeddings', 'fr': 'Débiaiser les intégrations contextualisées pré-entraînées', 'pt': 'Debiasing Embeddings contextualizados pré-treinados', 'ar': 'إزالة الحواف من التطريزات السياقية المدربة مسبقًا', 'es': 'Debiasing de incrustaciones contextualizadas previamente entrenadas', 'ja': '事前にトレーニングされたコンテキスト化された埋め込みの除去', 'zh': '消偏见之先练', 'hi': 'Debiasing पूर्व प्रशिक्षित Contextualized एम्बेडिंग', 'ru': 'Разрушение предварительно обученных контекстуализированных вложений', 'ga': 'Leabú Comhthéacsaithe Réamhoilte a Dhiúltú', 'el': 'Προετοιμασία προσχεδιασμένων περιεχομένων', 'ka': '@ label: listbox KDE distribution method', 'it': 'Debiasing Incorporazioni contestualizzate pre-formate', 'hu': 'Az előre képzett kontextualizált beágyazások vitatása', 'kk': '@ info: whatsthis', 'mk': 'Дебизирање на предобучени контекстни вградувања', 'mt': 'Id-Debijar ta’ Embeddings Kontekstwalizzati mħarrġa minn qabel', 'ml': 'മുമ്പ് പരിശീലനം ലഭ്യമാക്കിയ എംബെഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d ഡെബിയാസിങ്ങ്', 'lt': 'Iš anksto parengtų kontekstinių įrangų mažinimas', 'no': '@ info: whatsthis', 'ms': 'Menyebabkan Persembahan Berkonteks Terlatih Pra-dilatih', 'mn': 'Debiasing Pre-trained Contextualized Embeddings', 'si': '@ info: whatsthis', 'ro': 'Dezbaterea încorporărilor contextualizate pre-instruite', 'pl': 'Debatowanie wstępnie przeszkolonych kontekstualnych osadzeń', 'sv': 'Debatisera förhandsutbildade kontextualiserade inbäddningar', 'sr': 'Debiasing pre obučene kontekstualizacije', 'ur': 'Debiasing Pre- trained Contextualized Embeddings', 'so': 'Debiasing Debiasing', 'ta': 'முன் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட உள்ளடக்கங்களை நீக்குதல்', 'vi': 'Làm mờ các môi trường tương ứng', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'bg': 'Предварително обучени контекстуализирани вграждания', 'hr': 'Debiasing pre obučene kontekstualizacije', 'de': 'Debiasing vortrainierter kontextualisierter Einbettungen', 'id': 'Debiasing Pre-trained Contextualized Embeddings', 'ko': '사전 훈련의 상황화 삽입을 줄이다', 'fa': '@ info: tooltip', 'sw': 'Mazingira yaliyojifunza', 'da': 'Debiasing Forududdannede kontekstualiserede indlejringer', 'tr': 'Öňki Täzelenmiş Däplikler', 'nl': 'Vooropgeleide contextualiseerde embeddings debiasen', 'am': 'የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Debiasing Pre-trained Contextualized Embeddings', 'bn': 'পূর্ববর্তী প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষিত এমবেডিং', 'az': '∆Źvv…ôlc…ô t…ôhsil edilmiŇü Kontextualizasyonlar Debiasing', 'bs': 'Debiasing pre obučene kontekstualizacije', 'ca': 'Debiasing Pre-Trained Contextualized Embeddings', 'af': '@ label', 'cs': 'Debiasing Předškolené kontextualizované vložení', 'hy': 'Դաբիզեցնել նախապատրաստված կոնտեքստալիզացված ներգրավումները', 'fi': 'Esikoulutetut kontekstualisoitut upotukset', 'et': 'Eelkoolitud kontekstualiseeritud põimimiste arutelu', 'he': 'התערבות מתאימות קונטקסטולוגיות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Predhodno usposobljene kontekstualizirane vdelave', 'bo': 'Debiasing སྔོན་གྱིས་བསླབ་རྗེས་ཀྱི་ཁུལ་རྟགས་ཀྱིས་མཚོན་རྟགས', 'jv': 'Debia Ngerawat Rasai Keterahak Bapake Kontextual'}
{'en': 'In comparison to the numerous debiasing methods proposed for the static non-contextualised word embeddings, the discriminative biases in contextualised embeddings have received relatively little attention. We propose a fine-tuning method that can be applied at token- or sentence-levels to debias pre-trained contextualised embeddings. Our proposed method can be applied to any pre-trained contextualised embedding model, without requiring to retrain those models. Using gender bias as an illustrative example, we then conduct a systematic study using several state-of-the-art (SoTA) contextualised representations on multiple benchmark datasets to evaluate the level of biases encoded in different contextualised embeddings before and after debiasing using the proposed method. We find that applying token-level debiasing for all tokens and across all layers of a contextualised embedding model produces the best performance. Interestingly, we observe that there is a trade-off between creating an accurate vs. unbiased contextualised embedding model, and different contextualised embedding models respond differently to this trade-off.', 'ar': 'بالمقارنة مع طرق إزالة الحواف العديدة المقترحة لحفلات الزفاف الثابتة غير السياقية ، لم تحظ التحيزات التمييزية في حفلات الزفاف السياقية باهتمام كبير نسبيًا. نقترح طريقة ضبط دقيقة يمكن تطبيقها على مستويات رمزية أو جملة على حفلات الزفاف المدربة مسبقًا في debias. يمكن تطبيق طريقتنا المقترحة على أي نموذج تضمين سياقي تم تدريبه مسبقًا ، دون الحاجة إلى إعادة تدريب تلك النماذج. باستخدام التحيز الجنساني كمثال توضيحي ، نجري بعد ذلك دراسة منهجية باستخدام العديد من التمثيلات السياقية على أحدث طراز (SoTA) على مجموعات بيانات معيارية متعددة لتقييم مستوى التحيزات المشفرة في مختلف الزخارف السياقية قبل وبعد إزالة الحواف باستخدام المقترح. طريقة. وجدنا أن تطبيق تصحيح مستوى الرمز المميز لجميع الرموز وعبر جميع طبقات نموذج التضمين السياقي ينتج أفضل أداء. ومن المثير للاهتمام ، أننا نلاحظ أن هناك مفاضلة بين إنشاء نموذج تضمين سياقي دقيق مقابل غير متحيز ، ونماذج تضمين سياقية مختلفة تستجيب بشكل مختلف لهذه المقايضة.', 'fr': "Par rapport aux nombreuses méthodes de dépolarisation proposées pour les intégrations de mots statiques non contextualisées, les biais discriminants dans les intégrations contextualisées ont reçu relativement peu d'attention. Nous proposons une méthode de réglage fin qui peut être appliquée au niveau du jeton ou de la phrase aux intégrations contextualisées pré-entraînées par Debias. La méthode que nous proposons peut être appliquée à n'importe quel modèle d'intégration contextualisé pré-entraîné, sans qu'il soit nécessaire de recycler ces modèles. En utilisant les préjugés sexistes comme exemple illustratif, nous menons ensuite une étude systématique utilisant plusieurs représentations contextualisées de pointe (SoTA) sur plusieurs ensembles de données de référence afin d'évaluer le niveau de biais codés dans différents intégrations contextualisées avant et après le débiaisage à l'aide de la méthode proposée. Nous constatons que l'application de la dépolarisation au niveau des jetons pour tous les jetons et sur toutes les couches d'un modèle d'intégration contextualisé produit les meilleures performances. Il est intéressant de noter qu'il existe un compromis entre la création d'un modèle d'intégration contextualisé précis et impartial, et que différents modèles d'intégration contextualisée répondent différemment à ce compromis.", 'pt': 'Em comparação com os numerosos métodos de despolarização propostos para os embeddings estáticos não contextualizados de palavras, os vieses discriminativos em embeddings contextualizados receberam relativamente pouca atenção. Propomos um método de ajuste fino que pode ser aplicado em níveis de token ou sentença para embeddings contextualizados pré-treinados debias. Nosso método proposto pode ser aplicado a qualquer modelo de incorporação contextualizada pré-treinado, sem a necessidade de retreinar esses modelos. Usando o viés de gênero como exemplo ilustrativo, realizamos um estudo sistemático usando várias representações contextualizadas de última geração (SoTA) em vários conjuntos de dados de referência para avaliar o nível de vieses codificados em diferentes embeddings contextualizados antes e depois do desvio usando a proposta método. Descobrimos que a aplicação de debiasing em nível de token para todos os tokens e em todas as camadas de um modelo de incorporação contextualizado produz o melhor desempenho. Curiosamente, observamos que há uma troca entre a criação de um modelo de incorporação contextualizado preciso versus imparcial, e diferentes modelos de incorporação contextualizados respondem de forma diferente a essa troca.', 'es': 'En comparación con los numerosos métodos de debiasing propuestos para las incrustaciones estáticas de palabras no contextualizadas, los sesgos discriminativos en las incrustaciones contextualizadas han recibido relativamente poca atención. Proponemos un método de ajuste fino que se puede aplicar a nivel de token o de oración a las incrustaciones contextualizadas previamente entrenadas de Debian. Nuestro método propuesto se puede aplicar a cualquier modelo de incrustación contextualizado previamente entrenado, sin necesidad de volver a entrenar esos modelos. Utilizando el sesgo de género como ejemplo ilustrativo, realizamos un estudio sistemático utilizando varias representaciones contextualizadas de última generación (SoTA) en múltiples conjuntos de datos de referencia para evaluar el nivel de sesgos codificados en diferentes incrustaciones contextualizadas antes y después de la desactivación mediante el método propuesto. Descubrimos que la aplicación de debiasing a nivel de token para todos los tokens y en todas las capas de un modelo de incrustación contextualizado produce el mejor rendimiento. Curiosamente, observamos que hay una compensación entre crear un modelo de incrustación contextualizado preciso e imparcial, y los diferentes modelos de incrustación contextualizados responden de manera diferente a esta compensación.', 'ja': '静的な非文脈化された単語埋め込みのために提案された多数のデビアリング方法と比較して、文脈化された埋め込みにおける差別的バイアスは、比較的ほとんど注目されていない。 私たちは、トークンレベルまたは文レベルで、事前にトレーニングされたコンテキスト化された埋め込みのデビアスに適用できる微調整方法を提案します。 提案された方法は、あらゆる事前にトレーニングされたコンテキスト化された埋め込みモデルに適用でき、それらのモデルを再トレーニングする必要はありません。 次に、ジェンダーバイアスを例として、複数のベンチマークデータセット上のいくつかの最先端（ SoTA ）のコンテキスト化された表現を使用して、提案された方法を使用して、デバイアスの前後で異なるコンテキスト化された埋め込みでエンコードされたバイアスのレベルを評価する体系的な研究を行います。 コンテキスト化された埋め込みモデルのすべてのレイヤーで、すべてのトークンにトークンレベルのデビアリングを適用すると、最高のパフォーマンスが得られることがわかります。 興味深いことに、正確なコンテキスト化された埋め込みモデルと偏りのないコンテキスト化された埋め込みモデルを作成することと、異なるコンテキスト化された埋め込みモデルがこのトレードオフに異なる反応をすることとの間にトレードオフがあることが観察されます。', 'hi': 'स्थैतिक गैर-प्रासंगिक शब्द एम्बेडिंग के लिए प्रस्तावित कई debiasing विधियों की तुलना में, contextualized embeddings में भेदभावपूर्ण पूर्वाग्रहों को अपेक्षाकृत कम ध्यान दिया गया है। हम एक ठीक-ट्यूनिंग विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जिसे टोकन- या वाक्य-स्तरों पर लागू किया जा सकता है ताकि डेबियास पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित प्रासंगिक एम्बेडिंग को लागू किया जा सके। हमारी प्रस्तावित विधि को किसी भी पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित संदर्भित एम्बेडिंग मॉडल पर लागू किया जा सकता है, उन मॉडलों को फिर से प्रशिक्षित करने की आवश्यकता के बिना। एक उदाहरण के रूप में लिंग पूर्वाग्रह का उपयोग करते हुए, हम तब प्रस्तावित विधि का उपयोग करके और बाद में विभिन्न संदर्भित एम्बेडिंग में एन्कोड किए गए पूर्वाग्रहों के स्तर का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए कई बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर कई अत्याधुनिक (एसओटीए) संदर्भित अभ्यावेदनों का उपयोग करके एक व्यवस्थित अध्ययन करते हैं। हम पाते हैं कि सभी टोकन के लिए टोकन-स्तर debiasing लागू करने और एक contextualised एम्बेडिंग मॉडल की सभी परतों में सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन का उत्पादन करता है। दिलचस्प बात यह है कि, हम देखते हैं कि एक सटीक बनाम निष्पक्ष संदर्भित एम्बेडिंग मॉडल बनाने के बीच एक ट्रेड-ऑफ है, और विभिन्न प्रासंगिक एम्बेडिंग मॉडल इस ट्रेड-ऑफ के लिए अलग-अलग प्रतिक्रिया देते हैं।', 'zh': '与静态非语境化词嵌众去偏倚之法相比,语境化词嵌中判偏倚之关注较少。 凡立微调之法,可于标句应用于debias预练者上下文嵌之。 吾法可施于豫练之情,而不可复练也。 以性别偏见为例,用数集上最先进者(SoTA)情境化示系统研究,以估用所发之法去偏倚之前,与后于情境化嵌中编码偏倚水平。 凡诸令牌及上下文化嵌模者,令牌级偏倚可生最佳。 有趣者,吾观之,与无偏之境化销权衡,异情之应不同。', 'ru': '袩芯 褋褉邪胁薪械薪懈褞 褋 屑薪芯谐芯褔懈褋谢械薪薪褘屑懈 屑械褌芯写邪屑懈 写械斜懈邪褋懈褎懈泻邪褑懈懈, 锌褉械写谢芯卸械薪薪褘屑懈 写谢褟 褋褌邪褌懈褔械褋泻懈褏 薪械泻芯薪褌械泻褋褌褍邪谢懈蟹懈褉芯胁邪薪薪褘褏 胁谢芯卸械薪懈泄 褋谢芯胁, 写懈褋泻褉懈屑懈薪邪褑懈芯薪薪褘屑 褋屑械褖械薪懈褟屑 胁 泻芯薪褌械泻褋褌褍邪谢懈蟹懈褉芯胁邪薪薪褘褏 胁谢芯卸械薪懈褟褏 褍写械谢褟谢芯褋褜 芯褌薪芯褋懈褌械谢褜薪芯 屑邪谢芯 胁薪懈屑邪薪懈褟. 袦褘 锌褉械写谢邪谐邪械屑 屑械褌芯写 褌芯薪泻芯泄 薪邪褋褌褉芯泄泻懈, 泻芯褌芯褉褘泄 屑芯卸械褌 斜褘褌褜 锌褉懈屑械薪械薪 薪邪 褍褉芯胁薪械 褌芯泻械薪芯胁 懈谢懈 锌褉械写谢芯卸械薪懈泄 泻 锌褉械写胁邪褉懈褌械谢褜薪芯 芯斜褍褔械薪薪褘屑 泻芯薪褌械泻褋褌褍邪谢懈蟹懈褉芯胁邪薪薪褘屑 胁谢芯卸械薪懈褟屑 debias. 袩褉械写谢邪谐邪械屑褘泄 薪邪屑懈 屑械褌芯写 屑芯卸械褌 斜褘褌褜 锌褉懈屑械薪械薪 泻 谢褞斜芯泄 锌褉械写胁邪褉懈褌械谢褜薪芯 芯斜褍褔械薪薪芯泄 泻芯薪褌械泻褋褌褍邪谢懈蟹懈褉芯胁邪薪薪芯泄 屑芯写械谢懈 胁褋褌褉邪懈胁邪薪懈褟 斜械蟹 薪械芯斜褏芯写懈屑芯褋褌懈 锌械褉械芯斜褍褔械薪懈褟 褝褌懈褏 屑芯写械谢械泄. 袠褋锌芯谢褜蟹褍褟 谐械薪写械褉薪褍褞 锌褉械写胁蟹褟褌芯褋褌褜 胁 泻邪褔械褋褌胁械 懈谢谢褞褋褌褉邪褌懈胁薪芯谐芯 锌褉懈屑械褉邪, 屑褘 蟹邪褌械屑 锌褉芯胁芯写懈屑 褋懈褋褌械屑邪褌懈褔械褋泻芯械 懈褋褋谢械写芯胁邪薪懈械 褋 懈褋锌芯谢褜蟹芯胁邪薪懈械屑 薪械褋泻芯谢褜泻懈褏 褋芯胁褉械屑械薪薪褘褏 泻芯薪褌械泻褋褌褍邪谢懈蟹懈褉芯胁邪薪薪褘褏 锌褉械写褋褌邪胁谢械薪懈泄 (SoTA) 薪邪 薪械褋泻芯谢褜泻懈褏 褝褌邪谢芯薪薪褘褏 薪邪斜芯褉邪褏 写邪薪薪褘褏 写谢褟 芯褑械薪泻懈 褍褉芯胁薪褟 锌褉械写胁蟹褟褌芯褋褌懈, 蟹邪泻芯写懈褉芯胁邪薪薪芯泄 胁 褉邪蟹谢懈褔薪褘褏 泻芯薪褌械泻褋褌褍邪谢懈蟹懈褉芯胁邪薪薪褘褏 胁谢芯卸械薪懈褟褏 写芯 懈 锌芯褋谢械 褋屑械褖械薪懈褟 褋 懈褋锌芯谢褜蟹芯胁邪薪懈械屑 锌褉械写谢邪谐邪械屑芯谐芯 屑械褌芯写邪. 袦褘 芯斜薪邪褉褍卸懈谢懈, 褔褌芯 锌褉懈屑械薪械薪懈械 写械斜懈褉芯胁邪薪懈褟 薪邪 褍褉芯胁薪械 褌芯泻械薪芯胁 写谢褟 胁褋械褏 褌芯泻械薪芯胁 懈 写谢褟 胁褋械褏 褋谢芯械胁 泻芯薪褌械泻褋褌褍邪谢懈蟹懈褉芯胁邪薪薪芯泄 屑芯写械谢懈 胁褋褌褉邪懈胁邪薪懈褟 芯斜械褋锌械褔懈胁邪械褌 薪邪懈谢褍褔褕褍褞 锌褉芯懈蟹胁芯写懈褌械谢褜薪芯褋褌褜. 袠薪褌械褉械褋薪芯 芯褌屑械褌懈褌褜, 褔褌芯 褋褍褖械褋褌胁褍械褌 泻芯屑锌褉芯屑懈褋褋 屑械卸写褍 褋芯蟹写邪薪懈械屑 褌芯褔薪芯泄 懈 薪械锌褉械写胁蟹褟褌芯泄 泻芯薪褌械泻褋褌褍邪谢懈蟹懈褉芯胁邪薪薪芯泄 屑芯写械谢懈 胁褋褌褉邪懈胁邪薪懈褟, 懈 褉邪蟹谢懈褔薪褘械 泻芯薪褌械泻褋褌褍邪谢懈蟹懈褉芯胁邪薪薪褘械 屑芯写械谢懈 胁褋褌褉邪懈胁邪薪懈褟 锌芯-褉邪蟹薪芯屑褍 褉械邪谐懈褉褍褞褌 薪邪 褝褌芯褌 泻芯屑锌褉芯屑懈褋褋.', 'ga': 'I gcomparáid leis na modhanna díchlaonta iomadúla atá molta do leabú focal statach neamh-chomhthéacsaithe, is beag aird a tugadh ar na laofachtaí idirdhealaitheacha i leabaithe comhthéacsúla. Molaimid modh mionchoigeartaithe is féidir a chur i bhfeidhm ar leibhéil chomharthaí nó abairte chun leabú comhthéacsaithe réamh-oilte a dhéanamh. Is féidir an modh atá beartaithe againn a chur i bhfeidhm ar aon mhúnla leabú comhthéacsaithe réamh-oilte, gan gá leis na samhlacha sin a athoiliúint. Trí chlaonadh inscne a úsáid mar shampla léiritheach, déanaimid staidéar córasach ansin ag baint úsáide as roinnt léiriúcháin comhthéacsaithe den scoth (SoTA) ar il-thacair sonraí tagarmharcála chun leibhéal na gclaonadh atá ionchódaithe i leabaithe comhthéacsúla éagsúla a mheas roimh agus i ndiaidh an chlaontaithe ag baint úsáide as an tacar sonraí molta. modh. Feictear dúinn go gcruthaítear an fheidhmíocht is fearr nuair a dhéantar delaonadh ag leibhéal dearbhán a chur i bhfeidhm ar gach comhartha agus ar fud gach sraithe de shamhail leabaithe comhthéacsúla. Is díol spéise é go bhfuil comhbhabhtáil idir samhail leabú comhthéacsaithe cruinn vs. neamhchlaonta a chruthú, agus freagraíonn samhlacha leabaithe comhthéacsúla éagsúla don chomhbhabhtáil seo.', 'el': 'Σε σύγκριση με τις πολυάριθμες μεθόδους απομάκρυνσης που προτείνονται για τις στατικές μη περιεκτικότητες λέξεων, οι διακρίσεις στις περιεκτικότητες ενσωμάτωσης έχουν λάβει σχετικά μικρή προσοχή. Προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο συντονισμού που μπορεί να εφαρμοστεί σε επίπεδο συμβολαίων ή προτάσεων σε προ-εκπαιδευμένες ενσωματώσεις με πλαίσιο. Η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος μπορεί να εφαρμοστεί σε οποιοδήποτε προσχεδιασμένο μοντέλο ενσωμάτωσης, χωρίς να απαιτείται επανεκπαίδευση αυτών των μοντέλων. Χρησιμοποιώντας την προκατάληψη φύλου ως ενδεικτικό παράδειγμα, στη συνέχεια, διεξάγουμε μια συστηματική μελέτη χρησιμοποιώντας διάφορες υπερσύγχρονες αναπαραστάσεις σε πολλαπλά σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς για να αξιολογήσουμε το επίπεδο των προκατάληψης που κωδικοποιούνται σε διαφορετικές ενσωματωμένες στο πλαίσιο πριν και μετά την απομάκρυνση χρησιμοποιώντας την προτεινόμενη μέθοδο. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι η εφαρμογή απομάκρυνσης σε επίπεδο σήματος για όλα τα σήματα και σε όλα τα επίπεδα ενός μοντέλου ενσωμάτωσης με βάση το πλαίσιο παράγει την καλύτερη απόδοση. Ενδιαφέρον είναι ότι παρατηρούμε ότι υπάρχει ένα συμβιβασμό μεταξύ της δημιουργίας ενός ακριβούς και αμερόληπτου μοντέλου ενσωμάτωσης στο πλαίσιο, και διαφορετικά μοντέλα ενσωμάτωσης ανταποκρίνονται διαφορετικά σε αυτό το συμβιβασμό.', 'hu': 'A statikus, nem kontextuális szóbeágyazásokra javasolt számos diszkriminatív módszerrel összehasonlítva viszonylag kevés figyelmet kaptak a kontextuális beágyazások diszkriminatív elfogultságaira. Javasolunk egy finomhangolási módszert, amely token- vagy mondatszinteken alkalmazható debias előre képzett kontextuális beágyazásokra. Javasolt módszerünk bármely előre képzett kontextuális beágyazási modellre alkalmazható, anélkül, hogy ezeket a modelleket átképzésre lenne szükség. A nemi elfogultságok szemléltető példának felhasználásával szisztematikus tanulmányt végzünk több korszerű (SotA) kontextuális reprezentációval több referenciaadatkészleten, hogy értékeljük a különböző kontextuális beágyazásokban kódolt elfogultságok szintjét a javasolt módszer alkalmazásával. Úgy találjuk, hogy a token-szintű debiasing alkalmazása minden tokenre és a kontextuális beágyazási modell minden rétegére a legjobb teljesítményt eredményezi. Érdekes módon megfigyeljük, hogy van egy kompromisszum a pontos és az elfogulatlan kontextuális beágyazási modell létrehozása között, és a különböző kontextuális beágyazási modellek eltérően reagálnak erre a kompromisszumra.', 'ka': 'სტატიკური არ კონტექსტუალური სიტყვებისთვის, რამდენიმე განსხვავებული განსხვავებული მეტოვებისთვის შემდეგ, დისკრიმინატიური განსხვავებები კონტექსტუალურად დასხვავებული განსხვავებულ ჩვენ გვეძლევა სტრუნქტურაციის მეტი, რომელიც შეიძლება გამოყენება ტოკენ- ან სიტყვების დონეში დავუყენება სტრუნქტურაციული შემდეგ debias- ზე. ჩვენი პროგრამის მეტი შეიძლება აყენება ყველა პროგრამის კონტექსტუალურად განვითარებული მოდელზე, რომელიც არ უნდა ამ მოდელების გადასვლა. Gender bias as an illustrative example, we conduct a systematic study using several state-of-the-art (SoTA) contextualized representations on multiple benchmark datasets to evaluate the level of biases encoded in different contextualized embeddings before and after debiasing using the proposed method. ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ ყველა სიმბოლოებისთვის და ყველა სიმბოლოებისთვის კონტექსტუალურად ჩვენებული მოდელეტის დააყენება უკეთესი გამოყენება. საინტერესოდ, ჩვენ დავხედავთ, რომ კონტექსტუალური მოდელის შექმნა სწორი კონტექსტუალური მოდელის შექმნა და განსხვავებული კონტექსტუალური შექმნა მოდელის განსხვავებას განსხვავებულია ამ შექმ', 'it': "Rispetto ai numerosi metodi di debiasing proposti per le incorporazioni statiche di parole non contestualizzate, i pregiudizi discriminatori nelle incorporazioni contestualizzate hanno ricevuto relativamente poca attenzione. Proponiamo un metodo di fine-tuning che può essere applicato a livello token o frase alle incorporazioni contestualizzate pre-addestrate di debias. Il nostro metodo proposto può essere applicato a qualsiasi modello di embedding contestualizzato pre-addestrato, senza la necessità di riqualificare tali modelli. Utilizzando il bias di genere come esempio illustrativo, conduciamo quindi uno studio sistematico utilizzando diverse rappresentazioni contestualizzate state-of-the-art (SotA) su più set di dati di benchmark per valutare il livello di bias codificati in diversi incorporamenti contestualizzati prima e dopo il debiasing utilizzando il metodo proposto. Riteniamo che l'applicazione del debiasing a livello di token per tutti i token e su tutti i livelli di un modello di embedding contestualizzato produce le migliori prestazioni. È interessante notare che c'è un compromesso tra la creazione di un modello di incorporamento contestualizzato accurato e imparziale, e diversi modelli di incorporazione contestualizzati rispondono in modo diverso a questo compromesso.", 'kk': 'Статикалық контекстуалды емес сөздерді ендіру үшін қолданатын көптеген дебияциялау әдістерімен салыстырылып, контекстуалды ендіру үшін дискриминациялық өзгерістер салыстырылып тұрған. Біз таңбалау әдісін белгіленген контекстуалды ендіру үшін белгілер немесе сөйлем деңгейінде қолдануға болады. Біздің таңдаған әдіміміз бұл үлгілерді қайта алу керек болмаса, кез келген контекстуалды ендіру үлгісіне қолданылады. Gender bias дегенді көрсету мысалы ретінде жүйелік зерттеу арқылы бірнеше банкмарк деректер қорларындағы контекстуалдық (SoTA) деңгейінде бірнеше бағытталған мәліметтерді бағыттау үшін әртүрлі контекстуалды ендірілген ендіру деңгейінде, алдында және кейін деби Барлық белгілер мен контекстуалды ендіру үлгісінің барлық қабаттары үшін белгілер дебиазын қолдану үшін ең жақсы жылдамдығын жасайды. Қызықты түсінікті, біз дұрыс контекстуалды ендіру үлгісін құру арасында тәртіпсіздік тәртіпсіздік бар деп белгіледік, және әртүрлі контекстуалды ендіру үлгілері осы тәртіпсіздік кө', 'lt': 'Palyginti su daugeliu pasiūlytų statinių nekontekstualizuotų žodžių įterpimo debizavimo metodų, diskriminaciniai iškraipymai kontekstualizuotuose įterpimuose buvo gana mažai dėmesio skiriami. Siūlome patobulinti metodą, kuris gali būti taikomas simbolių arba sakinių lygiu debiams iš anksto apmokytiems kontekstiniams įdėjimams. Mūsų siūlomas metodas gali būti taikomas bet kuriam iš anksto parengtam kontekstiniam įterpimo modeliui, nereikalaujant iš naujo apmokyti tų modelių. Naudodami lyčių pusiausvyrą kaip iliustracinį pavyzdį, atliksime sisteminį tyrimą, naudojant keletą pažangiausių (SoTA) kontekstinius atstovavimus keliuose lyginamuosiuose duomenų rinkiniuose, kad įvertintume įvairiuose kontekstiniuose įterpimuose koduotų pusiausvyrų lygį prieš ir po to, kai pasiūlytas metodas sumažinamas. Mes manome, kad taikant visų ženklų ir visų kontekstinio įterpimo modelio sluoksnių žymenų lygio debijavimą užtikrinamas geriausias rezultatas. Įdomu, kad esama kompromiso tarp tikslaus ir nešališko kontekstinio įtraukimo modelio sukūrimo ir skirtingų kontekstinių įtraukimo modelių atsako į šį kompromisą skirtingai.', 'mk': 'In comparison to the numerous debiasing methods proposed for the static non-contextualised word embeddings, the discriminative biases in contextualised embeddings have received relatively little attention.  Предложуваме метод за финетизирање кој може да се примени на ниво на знаци или реченици на преобучени контекстуални вградувања на дебии. Нашиот предложен метод може да се примени на било кој предобучен контекстуален модел на вградување, без потреба да се ретренираат тие модели. Користејќи гендерска пристрасност како илустративен пример, потоа спроведуваме систематска студија користејќи неколку најсовремени (SoTA) контекстуални претставувања на многуте набори на податоци за benchmark за да го процениме нивото на пристрасности кодирани во различни контекстуални вградувања пред и по дебизација користејќи го предложениот метод Најдовме дека апликацијата на дебизација на ниво на симболи за сите симболи и низ сите слоеви на контекстуалниот модел на вградување произведува најдобра резултат. Interestingly, we observe that there is a trade-off between creating an accurate vs. unbiased contextualised embedding model, and different contextualised embedding models respond differently to this trade-off.', 'ml': 'സ്റ്റാറ്റിക്കില്ലാത്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ടിട്ടുള്ള ധാരാളം തെറ്റുകളുടെ രീതികള്\u200dക്ക് താല്\u200dപര്യത്തില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കാ നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നല്ല തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന രീതി നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും മുമ്പ് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഏതെങ്കിലും പ്രാദേശിപ്പിക്കപ്പെ ഒരു ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി പെണ്\u200dകുട്ടികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച്, പിന്നീട് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച രീതിയിലുള്ള സോട്ടാര്\u200dട്ട് ഓഫ് സോട്ടാര്\u200dട്ട് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d പല പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. വ്യത് എല്ലാ അടയാളങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും എല്ലാ തലകളിലുമുള്ള അടയാളങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നതാണ് നമുക്ക് കണ്ടെത്താന്\u200d കഴിയുന്നത്. അതിന്റെ മോഡ അത്ഭുതമായി, നമ്മള്\u200d കാണുന്നു, വ്യക്തമായ ഒരു കച്ചവടത്തിന്റെ ഇടയില്\u200d ഒരു വ്യാപാരം ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നത് നമ്മള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു, വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വ്യത്യാസപ്രദമാ', 'ms': 'Dengan membandingkan dengan banyak kaedah penyesalan yang dicadangkan untuk pembenaman perkataan statik tidak-kontekstualisasi, biases diskriminatif dalam pembenaman kontekstualisasi telah menerima perhatian relatif sedikit. Kami cadangkan kaedah penyesuaian yang boleh dilaksanakan pada aras token- atau kalimat-ke dalam kontekstual terlatih debias. Kaedah yang kami cadangkan boleh dilaksanakan pada mana-mana model penyambungan kontekstualisasi terlatih, tanpa memerlukan untuk melatih semula model tersebut. Dengan menggunakan bias jenis sebagai contoh ilustratif, kami kemudian melakukan kajian sistemik menggunakan beberapa perwakilan kontekstualisasi-state-of-the-art (SoTA) pada set data benchmark berbilang untuk menilai aras bias yang dikekodkan dalam bentuk kontekstualisasi berbeza sebelum dan selepas debiasing menggunakan kaedah yang direncanakan. Kami mendapati bahawa aplikasi pemindahan aras-token untuk semua token dan di seluruh semua lapisan model penyembedding kontekstual menghasilkan prestasi terbaik. Menarik, kita memperhatikan bahawa terdapat perdagangan antara mencipta model penyembedding yang tepat vs. tidak biasa kontekstualisasi, dan model penyembedding kontekstualisasi yang berbeza bertindak berbeza kepada perdagangan ini.', 'no': 'I sammenligning med dei fleire debiasing-metodane som foreslått for den statiske ikkje-kontekstualiserte ordinnbygginga har diskriminasjonane i kontekstualiserte innbygginga mottatt relativt liten oppmerking. Vi foreslår ein finnstillingsmetode som kan brukast på token- eller setningsnivå til debias før- trengte kontekstualiserte innbygging. Vårt foreslått metode kan brukast til alle forelærte kontekstualiserte innbyggingsmodeller, utan å kreva å gjenoppretta desse modelane. Bruk seks-forsikt som eit illustrativt eksempel, gjer vi så eit systematisk studie med fleire kontekstualiserte representasjonar på fleire benchmarkdatasett for å evaluera nivået av forsikt koda i ulike kontekstualiserte innbygging før og etter debiasing med den foreslåtte metoden. Vi finn at bruken av tokennivå debiasing for alle teikn og gjennom alle lag i eit kontekstualisert innbyggingsmodell gjer det beste utviklinga. I interessant måte vi observerer at det finst eit utvikling mellom å laga eit nøyaktig mot usynleg kontekstualisert innbyggingsmodell, og ulike kontekstualiserte innbyggingsmodeller svarar ulike på denne utviklinga.', 'mt': "Meta mqabbel mal-għadd kbir ta’ metodi ta’ debizzar proposti għall-inkorporazzjonijiet statiċi tal-kliem mhux kuntestwalizzati, il-preġudizzji diskriminatorji fl-inkorporazzjonijiet kuntestwalizzati rċevew relattivament ftit attenzjoni. Aħna nipproponu metodu ta' a ġġustament finat li jista' jiġi applikat fil-livelli tat-token jew tas-sentenza għal inkorporazzjonijiet kuntestwalizzati mħarrġa minn qabel tad-debias. Il-metodu propost tagħna jista’ jiġi applikat għal kwalunkwe mudell ta’ inkorporazzjoni kuntestwalizzata mħarreġ minn qabel, mingħajr ma jkun meħtieġ li dawk il-mudelli jiġu mħarrġa mill-ġdid. Bl-użu tal-preġudizzju bejn is-sessi bħala eżempju illustrattiv, imbagħad nagħmlu studju sistematiku bl-użu ta’ diversi rappreżentazzjonijiet kuntestwalizzati (SoTA) fuq settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ parametri referenzjarji multipli biex jiġi evalwat il-livell ta’ preġudizzji kkodifikati f’inkorporazzjonijiet kuntestwalizzati differenti qabel u wara d-debiżjar bl-użu tal-metodu propost. Aħna nsibu li l-applikazzjoni tad-debizzar fil-livell tat-tokens għat-tokens kollha u fis-saffi kollha ta’ mudell ta’ inkorporazzjoni kuntestwalizzat tipproduċi l-a ħjar prestazzjoni. Interessant, ninsabu li hemm kompromess bejn il-ħolqien ta’ mudell ta’ inkorporazzjoni kuntestwalizzat preċiż u mhux preċiż, u mudelli ta’ inkorporazzjoni kuntestwalizzati differenti jirrispondu b’mod differenti għal dan il-kompromess.", 'pl': 'W porównaniu do licznych metod debiatingu proponowanych dla statycznych niekontekstualizowanych osadzeń słów, uprzedzenia dyskryminacyjne w kontekstualizowanych osadzeniach poświęcono stosunkowo niewielkiej uwadze. Proponujemy metodę dostrajania, którą można zastosować na poziomie tokenów lub zdań do wstępnie przeszkolonych kontekstualizowanych osadzeń debias. Proponowana przez nas metoda może być zastosowana do dowolnego wstępnie przeszkolonego modelu osadzania kontekstowego, bez konieczności przeszkolenia tych modeli. Na ilustracyjnym przykładzie przeprowadzamy systematyczne badanie z wykorzystaniem kilku najnowocześniejszych kontekstowych reprezentacji (SoTA) na wielu zbiorach danych referencyjnych w celu oceny poziomu uprzedzeń zakodowanych w różnych kontekstowych osadzeniach przed i po wykorzystaniu proponowanej metody. Stwierdzimy, że zastosowanie debiacingu na poziomie tokenów dla wszystkich tokenów i we wszystkich warstwach kontekstowanego modelu osadzania zapewnia najlepszą wydajność. Co ciekawe, zauważamy, że istnieje kompromis między stworzeniem dokładnego a bezstronnego kontekstualizowanego modelu osadzania, a różne kontekstualizowane modele osadzania odpowiadają inaczej na ten kompromis.', 'ro': 'În comparație cu numeroasele metode de debiasing propuse pentru încorporările statice non-contextualizate de cuvinte, prejudecățile discriminatorii în încorporările contextualizate au primit relativ puțină atenție. Propunem o metodă de reglare fină care poate fi aplicată la nivelul token-urilor sau propozițiilor la încorporările contextualizate pre-instruite de debias. Metoda noastră propusă poate fi aplicată oricărui model de încorporare contextualizat pre-instruit, fără a fi necesară recalificarea acestor modele. Folosind părtinirea genului ca exemplu ilustrativ, efectuăm apoi un studiu sistematic utilizând mai multe reprezentări contextualizate de ultimă generație (SotA) pe mai multe seturi de date de referință pentru a evalua nivelul de părtiniri codificate în diferite încorporări contextualizate înainte și după debiasing folosind metoda propusă. Considerăm că aplicarea debitării la nivel de token pentru toate jetoanele și în toate straturile unui model de încorporare contextualizat produce cea mai bună performanță. Interesant, observăm că există un compromis între crearea unui model de încorporare contextualizat corect vs. imparțial, iar diferitele modele de încorporare contextualizate răspund diferit la acest compromis.', 'sr': 'U usporedbi sa mnogim metodama debijacije koje su predložene za statične ne-kontekstualizirane reči, diskriminacijske predrasude u kontekstualiziranim integracijama dobile su relativno malo pažnje. Predlažemo metodu za fino podešavanje koja se može primjenjivati na nivou znakova ili rečenice na debijase predobučene kontekstualizacije. Naš predloženi metod se može primjenjivati na bilo koji predobučeni kontekstualizirani model integracije, a ne zahteva da povratimo te modele. Koristeći spolne predrasude kao ilustrativni primjer, onda provodimo sistematsku studiju koristeći nekoliko kontekstualiziranih predstavljanja stanja umjetnosti (SoTA) na višestrukim standardnim setima podataka za procjenu nivoa predrasude kodiranih u različitim kontekstualiziranim integracijama prije i nakon debijacije koristeći predloženu metodu. Nalazimo da primjenjivanje razine znakova za sve znakove i preko svih slojeva kontekstualiziranog model a ugrađenja proizvodi najbolju predstavu. Zanimljivo, primećujemo da postoji trgovina između stvaranja tačnog protiv nepristrasnog kontekstualizovanog model a ugrađenja, i različitih kontekstualizovanih modela ugrađenja odgovaraju drugačije na ovu trgovinu.', 'mn': 'Олон төрлийн дүгнэлт хийх аргыг харьцуулахад, тохиромжгүй үгний нэвтрүүлэх арга барилгын харьцуулахад, тохиромжтой дүгнэлттэй хувьсгал нь харьцуулахад бага анхаарлаа хандуулсан. Бид тайван эсвэл өгүүлбэр-түвшинд сургалтын өмнө сургалтын туршилтын оролцоонд хэрэглэгдэж болно. Бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн арга нь эдгээр загваруудыг дахин аврах шаардлагагүйгээр дахин дасгал хөгжүүлсэн орчинд хэрэглэгдэж болно. Бид гендерийн тухай дүрслэлтэй жишээ болгон ашиглаж, дараа нь олон төрлийн урлагийн төвшин (SoTA) өгөгдлийн сан дээр олон төрлийн тооны үзүүлэлт хийсэн систематикийн судалгаа хийсэн. Бид бүх тэмдэгт болон орчин үеийн бүх давхар загварын давхар дүгнэлт хэрэглэх нь хамгийн сайн үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг. Хамгийн сонирхолтой нь, бид зөв орчин үеийн загварыг бүтээх хоорондын худалдааны хоорондын хоорондын худалдааны хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хооронд', 'so': 'Isbarbardhig u eg hababka cadaawayaasha ee loo soo jeeday inay si yar u jeedaan hadalka aan la mid aheyn. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab ku habboon, kaas oo lagu codsan karo heerarka calaamada ama qeybta ee debias marka hore la tababariyey. Noocyadaada la soo jeeday waxaa lagu codsan karaa sameyn kasta oo la tababaray oo la mid ah, iyadoon loo baahnayn in tusaalahaas dib looga celiyo. Sida a an tusaale ahaan ugu isticmaalno habka jinsiga, waxaynu sameynaa waxbarasho nidaamka ah oo isticmaalaya wadamada farshaxanka (SoTA) oo la soo jeeday wadamo badan oo ku qoran taariikhda bangitaanka, si aan u qiimeynno heerarka waxyaabaha lagu qoray oo ku qoran meelaha kala duwan ee la soo jeedo horta iyo dabadeedna baayacmushtarida isticmaalka uu soo jeeday. Waxaynu helnaa in codsashada qalabka calaamad-heerka iyo calaamada oo dhan iyo darafka kale oo uu sameynayo tusaale ka mid ah sameynta ayaa sameynta ugu wanaagsan. Si xiiso leh, waxaynu aragnaa in ganacsi ay leedahay mid si saxda ah u sameynta tusaale ka mid ah dhismaha dhismaha saxda iyo tusaale kala duwan oo ka mid ah sameynta ganacsiga.', 'ta': 'நிலையில்லாத வார்த்தைகளை ஒப்பிடும் பல பிழைநீக்கும் முறைமைகளை ஒப்பிடுவதில், நிலையில் குறிப்பிடும் பொருட்களில் உள்ள வேறுபாடுகளில் உள்ள நாங்கள் ஒரு நன்றாக உபயோகிக்கும் முறைமையை பிழையாசிகளுக்கு முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட பொருள்களில் அல்லது வாக்கியம் மட்டத்தில் பயன் Our proposed method can be applied to any pre-trained contextualised embedding model, without requiring to retrain those models.  உதாரணத்தை பயன்படுத்தி பெண்கள் பிரச்சினைகளை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். பின்னர் நாம் ஒரு முறைமையான படிப்பாட்டை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். பல நிலையான பெங்க்மார்க் தரவுத்தளங்களில் பிரச்சனைப்படுத நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கும் அது எல்லா குறிப்புகளுக்கும் குறிப்புகளுக்கும் அடுக்குகளுக்கும் சிறந்த செயல்படுத்துகிறது. சுவாரசியமாக, நாம் பார்க்க வேண்டும் என்றால் சரியான ஒரு வியாபாரத்தை உருவாக்கும் இடையில் ஒரு தொழில்நுட்பம் இருக்கிறது மற்றும் வேறு வித்தியாசம', 'si': 'In comparison to the number of debiasing ways advised for the static non-Contextuolized word Embdings, the discrdiscrdiscrdiscrminative bises in Contextuolized Embdings have got fairly low heed. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් ටොකෙන්- නැත්නම් වාක්ය- ස්තූතියෙන් ප අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විධානය පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන්  Using Genr Bias as an illustracive example, we then manage a system study with Severous state-of-the-art (SoTA) Contextuolized repressions on Multibench ark data sets to evalute the level of bises coded in Differous Contextuolized Embdings first and after debiasing use the advised way. අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් සියළු ටොකෙන් ලේවල් ඩෙබියාස් වෙනුවෙන් සියළු ටොකෙන් ලේවල් සහ සියළු සාමාන්\u200dය සංව විශේෂයෙන්, අපි බලන්නේ සිද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සිද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සිද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සිද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සිද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සිද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සං', 'sv': 'Jämfört med de många debiasing metoder som föreslagits för statiska icke-kontextuella ordinbäddningar, har de diskriminerande fördomarna i kontextuella inbäddningar fått relativt liten uppmärksamhet. Vi föreslår en finjusteringsmetod som kan tillämpas på token- eller meningsnivåer på debias förintränade kontextuella inbäddningar. Vår föreslagna metod kan tillämpas på alla pre-utbildade kontextuella inbäddningsmodeller, utan att behöva omskola dessa modeller. Med hjälp av genusbias som ett illustrativt exempel genomför vi sedan en systematisk studie med hjälp av flera state-of-the-art (SotA) kontextualiserade representationer på flera benchmarkdatauppsättningar för att utvärdera nivån av bias kodade i olika kontextualiserade inbäddningar före och efter debiasing med hjälp av den föreslagna metoden. Vi anser att tillämpningen av debiasing på token-nivå för alla tokens och över alla lager i en kontextualiserad inbäddningsmodell ger bästa prestanda. Intressant nog konstaterar vi att det finns en avvägning mellan att skapa en korrekt kontra opartisk kontextualiserad inbäddningsmodell, och olika kontextualiserade inbäddningsmodeller reagerar annorlunda på denna avvägning.', 'ur': 'بہت سی دبیزانگ طریقوں کے مقابلہ میں جو استٹیکس غیر متوسط کلمات کے مطابق پیش کیے گئے ہیں، متوسط انڈینگ میں بغیر بغیر بغیر متوسط کلمات کے مطابق بغیر بغیر متوسط ہونے والی بغیر بغیر بغ ہم نے ایک پاکیزہ تنظیم طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے جو ٹوکین یا جماعت-سطح پر استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں۔ ہماری پیشنهاد کی طریقہ کس طریقے پر قابل استعمال کی جاتی ہے جو پہلے تدریس کی تدریس کی مہینڈ موڈل پر ہے، بغیر اس کے کہ ان موڈلوں کو دوبارہ پلٹنا چاہے۔ جنس کی بغیر مثال کے طور پر ہم ایک سیستماتیک تحقیق کریں گے، پھر ہم بہت سیستماتیک تحقیق کے مطابق بہت سی بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ کے مطابق مختلف کنٹکسٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ سٹ کے مطابق مطابق کریں گے جو مختلف مطابق اندازے کے مطابق مختلف مطابق اندازے کئے گئے ہمیں معلوم ہے کہ ٹوکین سطح کے مطابق تمام ٹوکینوں اور تمام لائٹوں میں ایک متوسط انڈینگ موڈل کے مطابق اچھی فعالیت پیدا کرتا ہے ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ ایک دقیق نسبت بغیر منطقی منطقی امڈینگ موڈل پیدا کرنے کے درمیان ایک تجارت آف ہے اور مختلف منطقی امڈینگ موڈل اس تجارت کے بارے میں مختلف جواب دیتے ہیں.', 'vi': 'So với nhiều phương pháp làm hư hại đề xuất cho sự nhúng tay các từ không định hình tĩnh, các giả lập phân biệt trong các tình huống nhận diện có vẻ tương đối ít được chú ý. Chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp tinh chỉnh được áp dụng ở mức hình tượng hay câu cho tính thao túng của nợ. Phương pháp chúng ta đã đề nghị có thể áp dụng cho bất kỳ mô hình ghép tình hình trước đây, mà không cần phải tái tạo lại chúng. Sử dụng khuynh hướng giới tính làm ví dụ ví dụ, chúng tôi tiến hành một nghiên cứu có hệ thống, sử dụng nhiều biểu tượng hiện hiện thời trên nhiều bộ trình dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn để đánh giá mức độ giả dạng được mã hóa trong các trường hợp khác nhau trước và sau khi thao túng bằng phương pháp đã đề nghị. Chúng tôi thấy rằng áp dụng tính hiệu biểu tượng cho mọi thẻ và trên tất cả các lớp của mô hình ghép được áp chế tạo sẽ hiệu quả tốt nhất. Thật thú vị, chúng tôi thấy rằng có một sự trao đổi giữa việc tạo ra một mô hình nhận dạng chính xác và không được định trước, và những mô hình nền khác nhau phản ứng khác nhau phản ứng khác với vụ trao đổi này.', 'uz': "Istagan holatda bo'lmagan so'zlarning ko'pchilik deb aytish usullarini kamaytirish mumkin, taʼminlov bo'lgan paydo bo'lgan holatlarda juda kichkina paydo bo'lgan. Biz yaxshi taʼminlovchi bo'lgan paydo bo'ladigan soʻzlarda yoki maxfiy soʻzni debiyatlarni o'zgartirish mumkin. Bu modellarni qayta tiklash kerak boʻlmaydi, oldin taʼminlov qilingan modellarga qoʻllash mumkin. Using gender bias as an illustrative example, we then conduct a systematic study using several state-of-the-art (SoTA) contextualised representations on multiple benchmark datasets to evaluate the level of biases encoded in different contextualised embeddings before and after debiasing using the proposed method.  Biz o'rganamiz, hamma belgilar va hamma qatlamlarning hamma qatlamlari uchun signal darajada deb hisoblanish mumkin. Ko'rib chiqish modeli eng yaxshi bajarish natijasini yaratadi. Shunday qiziqarli, biz tashkilotni ko'rib chiqqamiz mumkin, aniqlik qilmagan tizim modelini yaratish va boshqa taʼminlov qilingan modellar bu tashkilotni boshqacha javob beradi.", 'bg': 'В сравнение с многобройните методи за дебиазиране, предложени за статичните неконтекстуализирани слова вграждания, дискриминационните отклонения в контекстуализираните вграждания са получили относително малко внимание. Предлагаме метод за фина настройка, който може да бъде приложен на ниво символ или изречение към дебиас предварително обучени контекстуализирани вграждания. Нашият предложен метод може да се приложи към всеки предварително обучен контекстуализиран модел за вграждане, без да се налага преквалификация на тези модели. Използвайки половото пристрастие като илюстративен пример, ние провеждаме систематично проучване, използвайки няколко най-съвременни контекстуализирани представи върху множество сравнителни набори от данни, за да оценим нивото на пристрастията, кодирани в различни контекстуализирани вграждания преди и след дебиазирането, като използваме предложения метод. Намираме, че прилагането на дебиазиране на ниво токен за всички токени и във всички слоеве на контекстуализирания модел за вграждане осигурява най-доброто представяне. Интересното е, че наблюдаваме компромис между създаването на точен и безпристрастен контекстуализиран модел за вграждане и различните контекстуализирани модели за вграждане реагират различно на този компромис.', 'nl': 'In vergelijking met de talrijke debiasing methodes die worden voorgesteld voor de statische niet-contextualiseerde woord embeddings, hebben de discriminatieve biases in contextualiseerde embeddings relatief weinig aandacht gekregen. We stellen een fine-tuning methode voor die op token- of zinneniveau kan worden toegepast op debias voorgetrainde contextualiseerde embeddings. Onze voorgestelde methode kan worden toegepast op elk vooraf getraind contextualiseerd inbeddingsmodel, zonder dat deze modellen hoeven te worden herscholen. Aan de hand van gender bias als illustratief voorbeeld, voeren we vervolgens een systematisch onderzoek uit met behulp van verschillende state-of-the-art (SoTA) contextualiseerde representaties op meerdere benchmark datasets om het niveau van biases gecodeerd in verschillende contextualiseerde embeddings voor en na debiasing te evalueren met behulp van de voorgestelde methode. We vinden dat het toepassen van debiasing op token-niveau voor alle tokens en over alle lagen van een contextualiseerd inbeddingsmodel de beste prestaties levert. Interessant is dat er een compromis bestaat tussen het creëren van een accuraat vs. onpartijdig contextualiseerd inbeddingsmodel, en verschillende contextualiseerde inbeddingsmodellen reageren anders op deze compromis.', 'hr': 'U usporedbi s mnogim metodama debijacije predloženim za statične neprekontekstualizirane riječi, diskriminacijske predrasude u kontekstualiziranim ugrađenjima primile su relativno malo pažnje. Predlažemo metodu za fino prilagođenje koje se može primjenjivati na nivou znakova ili kazne na predobučene kontekstualizacije debijasa. Naš predloženi metod se može primjenjivati na bilo koji predobučeni kontekstualizirani model integracije, a ne zahtijevajući povratak tih modela. Koristeći spolne predrasude kao ilustrativni primjer, onda provodimo sistematsko ispitivanje koristeći nekoliko kontekstualiziranih predstavljanja stanja umjetnosti (SoTA) na višestrukim standardnim setima podataka za procjenu razine predrasude kodiranih u različitim kontekstualiziranim integracijama prije i nakon debijacije koristeći predloženu metodu. Nalazimo da primjenjivanje razine znakova za sve znakove i kroz sve slojeve kontekstualiziranog model a ugrađenja proizvodi najbolju učinku. Zanimljivo, primećujemo da postoji trgovina između stvaranja to čnog protiv nepristrasnog kontekstualiziranog model a ugrađenja i različitih kontekstualiziranih modela ugrađenja odgovaraju drugačije na ovu trgovinu.', 'de': 'Im Vergleich zu den zahlreichen Debiasing-Methoden, die für die statischen nichtkontextualisierten Worteinbettungen vorgeschlagen werden, haben die diskriminierenden Verzerrungen in kontextualisierten Einbettungen relativ wenig Aufmerksamkeit erhalten. Wir schlagen eine Feinabstimmungsmethode vor, die auf Token- oder Satzebene auf debias vortrainierte kontextualisierte Einbettungen angewendet werden kann. Unsere vorgeschlagene Methode kann auf jedes vortrainierte kontextualisierte Einbettungsmodell angewendet werden, ohne dass diese Modelle neu geschult werden müssen. Anhand von Gender Bias als anschauliches Beispiel führen wir dann eine systematische Studie mit mehreren State-of-the-Art (SoTA) kontextualisierten Repräsentationen auf mehreren Benchmark-Datensätzen durch, um das Niveau der Biases zu bewerten, die in verschiedenen kontextualisierten Einbettungen vor und nach dem Debiasing kodiert sind. Wir stellen fest, dass die Anwendung von Debiasing auf Tokenebene für alle Token und über alle Ebenen eines kontextualisierten Einbettungsmodells die beste Leistung liefert. Interessanterweise beobachten wir, dass es einen Kompromiss zwischen der Erstellung eines präzisen vs. unvoreingenommenen kontextualisierten Einbettungsmodells gibt, und verschiedene kontextualisierte Einbettungsmodelle reagieren unterschiedlich auf diesen Kompromiss.', 'id': 'Dalam perbandingan dengan banyak metode debiasing yang diusulkan untuk pembenaman kata statis yang tidak kontekstualisasi, bias diskriminatif dalam pembenaman kontekstualisasi telah menerima perhatian relatif sedikit. Kami mengusulkan metode penyesuaian yang dapat dilaksanakan di tingkat token atau kalimat untuk debias penerbangan kontekstualisasi terlatih. Metode kami yang diusulkan dapat diterapkan pada setiap model embedding kontekstualisasi terlatih, tanpa membutuhkan untuk melatih ulang model tersebut. Menggunakan bias jenis sebagai contoh ilustratif, kami kemudian melakukan sebuah studi sistematis menggunakan beberapa represisi kontekstualisasi state-of-the-art (SoTA) pada beberapa set data benchmark untuk mengevaluasi tingkat bias yang dikodifikasikan dalam bentuk kontekstualisasi berbeda sebelum dan setelah debiasing menggunakan metode yang diusulkan. Kami menemukan bahwa aplikasi debiasing tingkat token untuk semua token dan di seluruh lapisan dari model embedding kontekstualisasi menghasilkan prestasi terbaik. Interestingly, we observe that there is a trade-off between creating an accurate vs. unbiased contextualised embedding model, and different contextualised embedding models respond differently to this trade-off.', 'ko': '정적 비어경화어 삽입을 위해 제기된 많은 감소 방법에 비해 어경화어 삽입에 대한 차별적 편견은 상대적으로 주목을 받지 못했다.우리는 표기나 문장 단계에서 debias가 미리 훈련한 상하 문화에 삽입할 수 있는 미세한 조정 방법을 제시했다.우리가 제시한 방법은 모든 사전 훈련의 상하문 삽입 모델에 적용될 수 있으며, 이러한 모델에 대해 재훈련을 할 필요가 없다.그 다음에 우리는 성별 편견을 예로 삼아 여러 개의 기준 데이터 집합에서 몇 가지 가장 선진적인(SoTA) 상황화 표현법을 사용하여 체계적인 연구를 하고 제시한 방법을 사용하여 차용 전후의 서로 다른 상황화 삽입 중의 인코딩에 대한 편견 수준을 평가한다.우리는 모든 영패와 상하 문화가 모델에 삽입된 모든 층에 영패 등급의 차용증을 적용하면 최상의 성능을 낼 수 있다는 것을 발견했다.흥미로운 것은 우리가 정확한 상황과 편견이 없는 상황화 삽입 모델을 만드는 데 균형이 존재하고 서로 다른 상황화 삽입 모델이 이런 균형에 대한 반응이 다르다는 것을 관찰했다.', 'fa': 'در مقایسه با روش\u200cهای بسیاری که پیشنهاد می\u200cشود برای جمع کردن کلمه\u200cهای غیر محیط، توجه\u200cهای جدایی در جمع\u200cآوری\u200cهای محیط به نسبتا کمی دریافت می\u200cکنند. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم روش تنظیم\u200cکننده\u200cای که می\u200cتواند در طبقه\u200cهای معمولی یا جمله\u200cهای پیش\u200cآموزش\u200cشده\u200cای برای دبی\u200cها استفاده شود. روش پیشنهاد ما می تواند به هر مدل پیش آموزشی آموزش داده شده\u200cای دریافت شود، بدون نیازی به بازگشت آن مدل\u200cها. با استفاده از تعادل جنسی به عنوان یک مثال نشان دهنده، سپس یک مطالعه سیستماتی را با استفاده از چند وضعیت هنر (SoTA) با استفاده از نمایش\u200cهای متناظر در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای متعدد سنگ\u200cمارک برای ارزیابی سطح تعادل\u200cهای متفاوتی که در مجموعه\u200cهای متناظر شده\u200cاند، پیش از و بعد از استفاده از ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که کاربرد سطح معجزه\u200cهای معجزه\u200cای برای همه نشانه\u200cها و در تمام لایه\u200cها از یک مدل متوسط پیدا کردن بهترین کاربرد را تولید می\u200cکند. Interestingly, we observe that there is a trade-off between creating an accurate vs. contextualized embedding model, and different contextualized embedding models differently respond to this trade-off.', 'sw': 'Kwa kulinganisha na mbinu nyingi za kudanganya zilizopendekezwa kwa neno lisilo la kutangaza, upendeleo wa kibaguzi katika viwanja vinavyoendelea vimepokea macho kidogo. Tunazipendekeza njia nzuri inayoweza kutumika katika ngazi za alama- au hukumu kwa mabomu yaliyojifunza kabla ya mafunzo. Utawala wetu uliopendekezwa unaweza kutumika kwenye modeli yoyote iliyoelekezwa kabla yenye utaratibu, bila kudai kurudisha mifano hiyo. Kwa kutumia upendeleo wa kijinsia kama mfano wa mfano, kisha tunafanya utafiti wa mfumo unaotumia wawakilishi kadhaa wa hali ya sanaa (SoTA) katika seti mbalimbali za bendera ili kutathmini kiwango cha upendeleo uliowekwa katika mabango tofauti yaliyotajwa kabla na baada ya kudanganya kwa kutumia njia ya pendekezo. Tunapata kwamba kutengeneza mabadiliko ya kiwango cha alama kwa ishara zote na juu ya vipande vyote vya muundo unaoendelea unaleta ufanisi mzuri. Inafurahisha, tunaona kuwa kuna biashara kati ya kutengeneza muundo sahihi dhidi ya ubaguzi usiokuwa na upendeleo, na mifano tofauti ya makazi yanayochanganyika yanajibu tofauti na biashara hii.', 'da': 'Sammenlignet med de talrige debiasing metoder, der foreslås for statiske ikke-kontekstualiserede ordindlejringer, har de diskriminerende fordomme i kontekstualiserede indlejringer fået relativt lidt opmærksomhed. Vi foreslår en finjusterende metode, der kan anvendes på token- eller sætningsniveauer på debias præ-trænede kontekstualiserede indlejringer. Vores foreslåede metode kan anvendes på enhver præ-trænet kontekstualiseret integreringsmodel, uden at det er nødvendigt at omskole disse modeller. Ved hjælp af kønsbias som et illustrativt eksempel gennemfører vi derefter en systematisk undersøgelse ved hjælp af flere state-of-the-art (SotA) kontekstualiserede repræsentationer på flere benchmark datasæt til at evaluere niveauet af bias kodet i forskellige kontekstualiserede indlejringer før og efter debiasing ved hjælp af den foreslåede metode. Vi finder ud af, at anvendelse af debiasing på token-niveau for alle tokens og på tværs af alle lag i en kontekstualiseret integreringsmodel giver den bedste ydeevne. Interessant nok bemærker vi, at der er en afvejning mellem at skabe en præcis vs. upartisk kontekstualiseret indlejringsmodel, og forskellige kontekstualiserede indlejringsmodeller reagerer forskelligt på denne afvejning.', 'tr': 'Aç sany küçümsiz söz integrasy üçin görkezilýän çökme yöntemleri bilen karşılaştyrylýar, tesbitlerde diskrimi öňlikleri relativ kiçi üns berildi. Biz token we sözlem derejesinde öňünden eğitilenen bölümlerde uygulanabilir bir şekilde tavsiye ediyoruz. Biziň teklif edilen yöntemimiz, ähli öňünden eğlenen metinçe nusga uygulanabilir, bu nusgalary gaýtalanmak gereksiz. Genç suçsuzluğunu görsel bir örnek olarak kullanarak sistematik bir çalışma yaptık ve teklif edilen yöntemi kullanarak çoklu benchmark veri setlerinde sistematik bir çalışma yaptık. Bir token derejesi ähli token üçin taýýarlamak üçin we ähli gatlaklaryň içinde nähili taýýarlanmasy üçin ullanýar. Gyzykly bolsa, biz diňleýän görnüşimizde dogry bir tesadüf düzenlemeli model döredişi we farklı tesadüf düzenlemeli modelleriň bu terjime edeniň üýtgeşigine üýtgeýändigini görýäris.', 'am': 'በተስተያየት፣ በተቃውሞው ተቃዋሚዎች ውስጥ ያልተቃውሞ ቃላት በሚያሳየው ብዙዎች የዲያብሳቢዎች ሥርዓቶችን በሚያሳየው ግንኙነት በጣም ጥቂት ትኩረት ተቀብለዋል፡፡ በምልክት ወይም የቁጥጥር ደረጃዎች ለዲያሲ አስቀድሞ በተወሰነ አካባቢዎች ለመጠቀም የሚችል መልካም ማድረግ እናሳስባታለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ሥርዓታችን ከዚህ በፊት ተማርኮ በተደረገ የግንኙነት አካባቢ ሞዴል ለመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡ የሴት ብያሽን ምሳሌ በመጠቀም፣ ከዚያም በኋላ በተዘጋጀው ሥርዓት (SoTA) በተለየ ብዙዎች የኢትዮጵያ አካባቢ ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም በተለየ ብሔራዊ አካባቢ ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም እና በተዘጋጀው ሥርዓት በተለየ ውይይት ላይ የድጋፍ ደረጃዎችን ለማስተዋል እና በተቃወሙት ስርዓት ለመጠቀም እና ከጥሰት በኋላ እና በተዘጋጀው ምልክት-ደረጃ ጥላቻን ለመጠቀም እና በተጨማሪው አካባቢ ሞዴል በሁሉም ደረጃዎች ላይ የተሻለ ስርዓት እንዲሠራ እናገኛለን፡፡ በአሳማሚ ነገር፣ በተቃወመ ተቃውሞ በተቃውሞ የውጤት አካባቢ ሞዴል መፍጠር መካከል የነጋዴነት መፍጠር እና የተለያየ የግንኙነት አካባቢ ዓይነቶች ለዚህ ንግድ ማድረግ በተለየ ይመልሳሉ፡፡', 'af': "In vergelyking met die menigte debiasing metodes wat voorgestel word vir die statiese nie-contextualiseerde woord inbêdings, het die diskriminasiewe voorspoedies in contextualiseerde inbêdings relativief klein aandag ontvang. Ons voorstel 'n fine- tuning metode wat kan aanwend word by token- of sentence- vlakke na debias vooraf- opgelei konteksualiseerde inbêdings. Ons voorgestelde metode kan toewend word na enige vooraf- opgelei konteksualiseerde inbêding model, sonder om daardie modele te herhaal. Gebruik ons dan 'n systeematiese studie deur die gebruik van gemeenskap-voorbeeld as 'n illustratiewe voorbeeld, deur die gebruik van verskeie staat-van-die-kuns (SoTA) konteksualiseerde voorstellings op veelvuldige benchmarkdatastelle te evalueer om die vlak van voorbeeld wat in verskeie konteksualiseerde inbêdinge gekodeer is in verskeie konteksualiseerde in Ons vind dat die toepassing van token-vlak debiasing vir alle tekens en oor alle laagte van 'n contextualiseerde inbêding model die beste prestasie produseer. Interesante, ons observeer dat daar 'n verkoop-af tussen die skep van 'n presies teen onbiasiese konteksualiseerde inbêding model is, en ander konteksualiseerde inbêding-modele antwoord anders na hierdie verkoop-af.", 'sq': 'Në krahasim me metodat e shumta të debizimit të propozuara për përfshirjet statike jo-kontekstuale të fjalëve, paragjykimet diskriminuese në përfshirjet kontekstuale kanë marrë relativisht pak vëmendje. Ne propozojmë një metodë të përshtatshme që mund të aplikohet në nivelet e token- ose dënimit në debias të përfshirjeve kontekstuale të paratrajnuara. Metoda jonë e propozuar mund të aplikohet në çdo model të paratrajnuar kontekstualizuar të përfshirjes, pa kërkuar ripërtëritjen e këtyre modeleve. Duke përdorur paragjykimin e gjinisë si shembull ilustrues, ne pastaj kryejmë një studim sistematik duke përdorur disa përfaqësime kontekstuale të state-of-the-art (SoTA) mbi grupe të dhënash të shumëfishta benchmark për të vlerësuar nivelin e paragjykimeve të koduar në përfaqësime të ndryshme kontekstuale përpara dhe pas debizimit duke përdorur metodën e propozuar. Ne gjejmë se aplikimi i debizimit të nivelit të token për të gjitha tokens dhe në të gjitha nivelet e një modeli të përfshirë kontekstualizuar prodhon performancën më të mirë. Interesante, ne vëzhgojmë se ekziston një kompromis midis krijimit të një modeli të saktë përballë të pafajshëm kontekstualizuar përfshirjeje dhe modeleve të ndryshme kontekstualizuar përfshirjeje reagojnë ndryshe ndaj kësaj kompromisi.', 'az': 'Statik olmayan sözlər içərisində təklif edilən çoxlu debiasing metodları ilə qarşılaşdığında, müxtəlif in şallarında diskriminat tərzlərinin çoxluğu qədər az dikkati alındı. Biz öyrəndiyimiz müxtəlif məsələlərə debias təhsil edilmiş müəyyən məsələlərdə istifadə edilə bilən yaxşı düzəltmə metodlarını təklif edirik. Bizim təbliğ edilmiş metodumuz, bu modelləri geri almaq istəmədən, əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş müxtəlif inşa modellərə uyğulana bilər. Cinlər tərzlərini göstərici bir məsəl olaraq istifadə edirik, sonra müəyyən olunmuş metodları istifadə etməkdən əvvəl və dəyişdirmədən sonra, müxtəlif tərzlərin kodlanması üçün çoxlu benchmark veri setlərində müxtəlif tərzlərində kodlanmış tərzlərinin səviyyəsini değerləşdirmək üçün sistematik bir təhsil işlədik. Bütün möcüzələr və müxtəlif inşa modelinin bütün səviyyələrində möcüzə düzəltməsi ən yaxşı performans yaratdığını görürük. İlginç ki, biz müəyyən edirik ki, bu ticarətdə düzgün bir məsəl yaratmaq və müxtəlif müəyyən müəyyən müxtəlif məsəllər yaratmaq arasında dəyişiklik var.', 'bn': 'প্রস্তাবিত বিভিন্ন বিভ্রান্ত পদ্ধতির তুলনায়, প্রতিযোগিতার বিভিন্ন বিভ্রান্ত বাক্যের প্রস্তাব প্রদান করা হয়েছে যে বিভিন্ন বিভ্রান্তিকর ব আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি একটি সুন্দর টিউনিং পদ্ধতি যা প্রশিক্ষণের পূর্বে প্রশিক্ষিত প্রতিযোগিতায় ডিবিয়ার স্তরে প্রয়োগ করা যাবে। আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত প্রথম প্রশিক্ষিত কোন প্রযুক্তি প্রযুক্তি প্রদান করা যাবে যে কোন মডেল পু প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করে বেশ কয়েকটি বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটে প্রতিনিধিত্বিত প্রতিনিধিত্বের ব্যবহার করে আমরা একটি সিস্টেমিক গবেষণা ব্যবহার করি। আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে সকল চিহ্নের জন্য প্রতিক্রিয়া স্তরে ধ্বংস করার প্রয়োজন এবং প্রতিযোগিতার প্রান্তের প্রান্তে প্রযোজ্য মজার ব্যাপারে আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে সঠিক বিভিন্ন প্রতিযোগিতার বিরুদ্ধে বিভিন্ন প্রতিযোগিতা মডেল সৃষ্টি করার মধ্যে একটি ব্যবসা আটকে যাচ্ছে, আর বি', 'cs': 'Ve srovnání s mnoha metodami debiazování navrženými pro statické nekontextualizované vkládání slov se diskriminačním předsudkům v kontextualizovaných vkládáních věnovala relativně málo pozornosti. Navrhujeme metodu jemného ladění, kterou lze aplikovat na úrovni tokenů nebo vět na debias předškolené kontextualizované vložení. Naše navržená metoda může být aplikována na jakýkoliv předškolený kontextualizovaný model vložení, aniž by bylo nutné tyto modely přeškolit. Na ilustrativním příkladu provedeme systematickou studii s využitím několika nejmodernějších (SoTA) kontextualizovaných reprezentací na více benchmarkových datových sadách k vyhodnocení úrovně předsudků kódovaných v různých kontextualizovaných vloženích před a po debiazování navrhovanou metodou. Zjišťujeme, že použití debiacingu na úrovni tokenů pro všechny tokeny a napříč všemi vrstvami kontextualizovaného modelu vkládání přináší nejlepší výkon. Zajímavé je, že existuje kompromis mezi vytvořením přesného a nestranného kontextualizovaného modelu vkládání a různými kontextualizovanými modely vkládání reagují na tento kompromis odlišně.', 'hy': 'Համեմատելով վիճակական ոչ կոնտեքստալիզացված բառերի ներդրման համար առաջարկված բազմաթիվ թերուցման մեթոդներին, կոնտեքստալիզացված ներդրման մեթոդների խտրականությունը համեմատաբար քիչ ուշադրություն է ստացել: Մենք առաջարկում ենք բարելավման մեթոդ, որը կարող է կիրառվել նշանների կամ նախադասությունների մակարդակներում դեբիայի նախապատրաստված կոնտեքստոլացված ներդրումների համար: Մեր առաջարկված մեթոդը կարող է կիրառվել ցանկացած նախապատրաստված կոնտեքստիալ ներգրավման մոդելի վրա, առանց պարտադիր վերադասավորելու այդ մոդելները: Օգտագործելով գենդերային կողմնականությունը որպես ցուցադրական օրինակ, հետո մենք կատարում ենք սիստեմատիկ ուսումնասիրություն օգտագործելով մի քանի բարձրագույն տեխնոլոգիական (ՍոԹԱ) կոնտեքստոնալ ներկայացումներ բազմաթիվ համեմատական տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, որպեսզի գնահատենք կոնտեքստոնալ ներդր Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ նշանների մակարդակի դիբեզայնացումը բոլոր նշանների և կոնտեքստիալ ներդրման մոդելի բոլոր շերտերի համար առաջացնում է լավագույն արդյունք: Հետաքրքիր է, որ մենք նկատում ենք, որ կա հակամարտություն ճշգրիտ և ոչ կոնտեքստիալ ներդրման մոդելի ստեղծման միջև, և տարբեր կոնտեքստիալ ներդրման մոդելները տարբեր կերպ են արձագանքում այս հակամարտությանը:', 'fi': 'Verrattuna useisiin staattisiin kontekstualisoimattomiin sanaupotuksiin, kontekstualisoiduissa upotuksissa esiintyviin syrjintävääristymiin on kiinnitetty suhteellisen vähän huomiota. Ehdotamme hienosäätömenetelmää, jota voidaan soveltaa token- tai lausetasolla debias-esikoulutettuihin kontekstualisoituihin upotuksiin. Ehdotettua menetelmää voidaan soveltaa mihin tahansa esikoulutettuun kontekstuaaliseen upotusmalliin ilman, että näitä malleja tarvitsee kouluttaa uudelleen. Käyttäen sukupuoliharhaa havainnollisena esimerkkinä, suoritamme systemaattisen tutkimuksen käyttäen useita nykytekniikan (SoTA) kontekstualisoituja esityksiä useista vertailuaineistoista arvioidaksemme eri kontekstualisoituihin upotuksiin koodattujen viesteiden tasoa ennen ja jälkeen debiasointia ehdotetulla menetelmällä. Huomaamme, että token-tason debiaasin soveltaminen kaikkiin tokeneihin ja kontekstualisoidun upotusmallin kaikkiin kerroksiin tuottaa parhaan suorituskyvyn. Mielenkiintoista on huomata, että tarkan ja puolueettoman kontekstuaalisen upotusmallin luominen on kompromissi, ja erilaiset kontekstuaaliset upotusmallit reagoivat eri tavalla tähän kompromissiin.', 'ca': "In comparison to the numerous debiasing methods proposed for the static non-contextualised word embeddings, the discriminative biases in contextualised embeddings have received relatively little attention.  Proposem un mètode d'ajustament que es pot aplicar a nivells de fitxes o frases a les incorporacions contextualitzades pré-entrenades. El nostre mètode proposat pot ser aplicat a qualsevol model d'integració contextualitzat pré-entrenat, sense requerir que els torni a treinar. Utilitzant el bias de gènere com exemple il·lustratiu, després fem un estudi sistemàtic utilitzant diverses representacions contextualitzades (SoTA) en múltiples conjunts de dades de referència per avaluar el nivell de biases codificats en diferents integracions contextualitzades abans i després de debitzar amb el mètode proposat. We find that applying token-level debiasing for all tokens and across all layers of a contextualised embedding model produces the best performance.  Interessant, observem que hi ha un compromís entre la creació d'un model d'incorporació contextualitzat i correcte, i diferents models d'incorporació contextualitzats responen de manera diferent a aquest compromís.", 'bs': 'U usporedbi s mnogim metodama debijacije koje su predložene za statične ne-kontekstualizirane riječi, diskriminacijske predrasude u kontekstualiziranim integracijama dobile su relativno malo pažnje. Predlažemo metodu finalnog prilagođavanja koja se može primjenjivati na nivou znakova ili kazne na predobučene kontekstualizacije debijasa. Naš predloženi metod se može primjenjivati na bilo koji predobučeni kontekstualizirani model uključivanja, a da ne zahtijevamo povratak tih modela. Koristeći spolne predrasude kao ilustrativni primjer, onda provodimo sistematsko ispitivanje koristeći nekoliko kontekstualiziranih predstavljanja stanja umjetnosti (SoTA) na višestrukim standardnim setima podataka za procjenu nivoa predrasude kodiranih u različitim kontekstualiziranim integracijama prije i nakon debijacije koristeći predloženu metodu. Nalazimo da primjenjivanje razine znakova za sve znakove i preko svih slojeva kontekstualiziranog ugrađenog model a proizvodi najbolje izvršenje. Zanimljivo, primećujemo da postoji trgovina između stvaranja tačnog protiv nepristrasnog kontekstualizovanog model a ugrađenja i različitih kontekstualizovanih modela ugrađenja odgovaraju drugačije na ovaj trgovin.', 'et': 'Võrreldes staatiliste sõnade kontekstiseerimata manustamise puhul välja pakutud arvukate debialiseerimismeetoditega on diskrimineerivad kallakud kontekstiseeritud manustamise puhul suhteliselt vähe tähelepanu pööratud. Pakume välja peenhäälestusmeetodi, mida saab rakendada märgi- või lausetasemel debias eelnevalt koolitatud kontekstipõhiste manustamiste puhul. Meie kavandatud meetodit saab rakendada mis tahes eelnevalt koolitatud kontekstipõhise manustamismudeli suhtes, ilma et oleks vaja neid mudeleid ümber koolitada. Kasutades illustratiivset näidet soolise erapooletuse kohta, teostame seejärel süstemaatilise uuringu, kasutades mitmeid kaasaegseid kontekstipõhiseid esitusi mitme võrdlusandmekogumi kohta, et hinnata erinevates kontekstipõhistes manustamistes kodeeritud erapooletuse taset enne ja pärast seda, kasutades kavandatud meetodit. Leiame, et tokeni tasemel debiasimise rakendamine kõigile tokenitele ja kontekstipõhise manustamismudeli kõigile kihtidele annab parima jõudluse. Huvitavalt märgime, et täpse ja erapooletu kontekstipõhise manustamismudeli loomisel on kompromiss ning erinevad kontekstipõhised manustamismudelid reageerivad sellele kompromissile erinevalt.', 'jv': 'text-decorationtextattr Awak dhéwé ngerbah akeh sistem sing dibutuhke tarjamahan kanggo nggambar token- o nggabi-evel kanggo debiah, gambar tekan contextual embedding. Awak dhéwé Perintah sing dipoleh iso nggawe ning model sing wis nguasai cara-cara contextual Ngawe ngubah Genjer bias nganggep sistem sing dumadhakan text-tool-action Ngerti luwih-luwih, awak dhéwé ngerasakno kayané perusahaan karo hal-hal nganggo perusahaan pakan karo ngono nggawe model sing wis nguasakno ngono perusahaan model sing wis dipun wae, lan model sing wis dipun nguasakno ilegal gawe nguasakno.', 'he': 'בהשוואה לשיטות השפלה המספרות שהצעו עבור התכניות המילים הסטטיות ללא הקונטלקטואליזציה, ההתמונות המדחיפות בתכניות הקונטלקטואליזציות קיבלו תשומת לב מעט יחסית. אנו מציעים שיטה מתאימה שיכולה להשתמש ברמה של סימנים או משפטים לתכניות קונטקסטולוגיות מאומנות מראש של דוביס. השיטה המוצעת שלנו יכולה להיות שימושית לכל דוגמא קונטוקטואליזציה מאומנת מראש, מבלי לדרוש לאמן מחדש את הדוגמאות האלה. Using gender bias as an illustrative example, we then conduct a systematic study using several state-of-the-art (SoTA) contextualised representations on multiple benchmark datasets to evaluate the level of biases encoded in different contextualised embeddings before and after debiasing using the proposed method.  We find that applying token-level debiasing for all tokens and across all layers of a contextualised embedding model produces the best performance.  מעניין, אנו רואים שיש הסכם בין יצירת מודל קיצוב מדויק נגד מודל קיצוב לא מוצד, ומודלים קיצוב קונטוקטואלי שונים מגיבים אחרת למסחר הזה.', 'ha': "@ info Tuna buɗe wata metode mai kyau wanda za'a iya amfani da shi a cikin alama- ko-levels-gafuwa zuwa da aka haramta wa kwanan da aka ƙididdige shi. @ action: button Yi amfani da misali na jini kamar misali, sai mu yi aiki da wani littãfi na'ura da ke amfani da wasu state-of-the-art (SoTA) masu daidaita masu motsi da aka bukatar da su a kan wasu matsayin bangon-bangon data-set to evaluate levels of abinci wanda aka encoded in wasu taɓallun da aka ƙididdige shi a gaba da bayan ta yi amfani da shiryarwa wanda aka yi tunãni. Tuna gane cewa za'a amfani da alama-daraja zuwa duk ãyoyin da ke duk cikin duffai da misãlai da aka ƙunsa da shi, yana ƙara mafi kyaun aikin. Ina mai amfani da shi, munã ganin wani fatauci a tsakanin ya samo wani shekara tsakanin da ya sami motel mai rasmi a kanzu-sami-sami da ke sami motsi masu cikin shirin da aka samu da shi dabam-daban.", 'bo': 'སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་གསལ་རྣམ་པ་མེད་པའི་བརྗོད་བྱེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བཏོན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་Token-ཡང་ན་ཚིག་ཕྱོགས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་བྱས་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བྱས་ཆོག་པ་་་ ང་ཚོའི་གྲོས་འཆར་བྱས་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག Using gender bias as an illustrative example, we then conduct a systematic study using several state-of-the-art (SoTA) contextualized representations on multiple benchmark datasets to evaluate the level of biases encoded in different contextualized embeddings before and after debiasing using the proposed method. ང་ཚོས་མཐོང་ནི་གསལ་རྟགས་ཡོད་མེད་ལ་ཉེན་རྟོགས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་གང་ཡོངས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བཏོན་ཡོད་པའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་སྐྱེས་ཚད་ འཛམ་གླིང་མ་ཟད། ང་ཚོས་མཐོང་ན་ཁྱབ་པར་བརྗོད་འདུག', 'sk': 'V primerjavi s številnimi metodami obremenjevanja, predlaganimi za statične nekontekstualizirane besede, so diskriminacijske pristranskosti v kontekstualiziranih vdelah deležne relativno malo pozornosti. Predlagamo metodo finega uravnavanja, ki se lahko uporablja na ravni žetonov ali stavkov za vnaprej usposobljene kontekstualizirane vdelave debias. Naša predlagana metoda se lahko uporablja za vsak vnaprej usposobljen kontekstualni model vgradnje, ne da bi bilo treba teh modelov preusposabljati. Z uporabo pristranskosti med spoloma kot ilustrativnega primera smo nato izvedli sistematično študijo z uporabo več najsodobnejših kontekstualiziranih reprezentacij na več referenčnih naborih podatkov, da bi ocenili stopnjo pristranskosti, kodiranih v različnih kontekstualiziranih vdelavah pred in po debiasiranju z uporabo predlagane metode. Ugotavljamo, da uporaba debiasing na ravni žetonov za vse žetone in v vseh plasteh kontekstualiziranega modela vdelave zagotavlja najboljšo učinkovitost. Zanimivo je, da obstaja kompromis med ustvarjanjem natančnega in nepristranskega kontekstualiziranega modela vključevanja, različni kontekstualizirani modeli vključevanja pa se na ta kompromis odzivajo drugače.'}
{'en': 'Cross-lingual Visual Pre-training for Multimodal Machine Translation', 'ar': 'التدريب المسبق المرئي عبر اللغات للترجمة الآلية متعددة الوسائط', 'es': 'Preentrenamiento visual multilingüe para traducción automática multimodal', 'pt': 'Pré-treinamento visual multilíngue para tradução automática multimodal', 'fr': 'Pré-formation visuelle multilingue pour la traduction automatique multimodale', 'zh': '多模式机器翻译跨语视预培训', 'ja': 'マルチモーダルマシン翻訳のためのクロスリンガルビジュアル事前トレーニング', 'hi': 'मल्टीमॉडल मशीन अनुवाद के लिए क्रॉस-भाषी दृश्य पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण', 'ru': 'Межъязычное визуальное предварительное обучение для мультимодального машинного перевода', 'ga': 'Réamhoiliúint Amharc Trastheangach don Aistriúchán Meaisín Ilmhódach', 'el': 'Διασγλωσσική Οπτική Προεκπαίδευση για Πολυμεταφορική Μηχανική Μετάφραση', 'hu': 'Többnyelvű vizuális előképzés multimodális gépi fordításhoz', 'it': 'Pre-formazione visiva multilingue per la traduzione automatica multimodale', 'ka': 'Multimodal Machine Translation', 'mk': 'Кросјазична визуелна предобука за мултимодилен превод на машини', 'lt': 'Tarpkalbis vizualinis parengiamasis mokymas daugiarūšio transporto priemonių vertimui', 'kk': 'Мультимодельді машинаны аудару үшін көптеген визуалдық алдын- оқыту', 'mt': 'Cross-lingual Visual Pre-training for Multimodal Machine Translation', 'ml': 'Multimodal Mashine Translation', 'mn': 'Олон-моделийн машины хөрөнгө оруулахын тулд олон хэлний өмнө харагдах сургалт', 'ms': 'Pra-latihan Visual Selasa-bahasa untuk Terjemahan Mesin Multimodal', 'no': 'Krysspråk visuell føreøving for fleire maskinsomsetjingar', 'pl': 'Wielojęzyczne szkolenie wizualne dla multimodalnego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'ro': 'Pregătire vizuală translingvă pentru traducerea automată multimodală', 'si': 'විශාල භාෂාවික ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් විශාල ප්\u200dරධානය', 'sv': 'Tvärspråkig visuell förberedelse för multimodal maskinöversättning', 'so': 'Waxbarashada u diyaarinta qoraalka luuqadaha iskuulka', 'ta': 'பல மாற்று இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்புக்கான கிராஸ்- மொழி பார்வை முன் பயிற்சி', 'ur': 'Multimodal Machine Translation for Cross-lingual Visual Pre-training', 'sr': 'Preobrazovanje preko jezika vizualnog predobuka za multimodalno preobrazovanje mašina', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Dịch sang ngôn ngữ khác nhau Hình ảnh', 'bg': 'Многоезична визуална подготовка за мултимодален машинен превод', 'nl': 'Meertalige visuele pre-training voor multimodale machinevertaling', 'da': 'Tværsproget visuel foruddannelse til multimodal maskinoversættelse', 'ko': '다중모드 기계 번역의 다중 언어 시각 예습 훈련', 'hr': 'Preobrazovanje vizualnog preobrazovanja multimodalnih uređaja', 'de': 'Sprachübergreifende visuelle Vorbereitungen für multimodale maschinelle Übersetzung', 'id': 'Cross-lingual Visual Pre-training for Multimodal Machine Translation', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Mashine', 'tr': 'Çoklumodal Maşynyň terjime edilmesi üçin Çapraz Dilli Görnüş Öňki Ewezam', 'af': 'Name', 'fa': 'تعلیم پیش\u200cآموزش دیده\u200cهای متوسط زبان برای ترجمه ماشین\u200cهای متوسط', 'hy': 'Cross-lingual Visual Pre-training for Multimodal Machine Translation', 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'bn': 'বহুমোডাল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য ক্রস- ভাষায় ভিজুয়াল প্রশিক্ষণ পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষণ', 'bs': 'Preobrazovanje vizualnog preobrazovanja multimodalnih uređaja', 'ca': 'Preentrenament visual translingüe per a la traducció multimodal de màquines', 'cs': 'Vícejazyčné vizuální předškolení pro multimodální strojový překlad', 'fi': 'Monikielinen visuaalinen esikoulutus multimodaaliseen konekäännökseen', 'et': 'Keeleülene visuaalne eelkoolitus mitmeliigilise masintõlke jaoks', 'sq': 'Parastërvitje vizuale ndërgjuhësore për përkthimin multimodal të makinave', 'az': 'Çoxlu modal maşın tərcüməsi üçün çoxlu dilli Visual Pre-training', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'he': 'אימון ראשי צלב-שפתי לתרגום מכונות רבות', 'sk': 'Večjezično vizualno predusposabljanje za multimodalni strojni prevod', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'སྣ་མང་ཆེ་མཐོང་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཐད་ནས་ཆ་རྩིས་འཁོར་ལ་བསྒྱུར་ན།'}
{'en': 'Pre-trained language models have been shown to improve performance in many natural language tasks substantially. Although the early focus of such models was single language pre-training, recent advances have resulted in cross-lingual and visual pre-training methods. In this paper, we combine these two approaches to learn visually-grounded cross-lingual representations. Specifically, we extend the translation language modelling (Lample and Conneau, 2019) with masked region classification and perform pre-training with three-way parallel vision & language corpora. We show that when fine-tuned for multimodal machine translation, these models obtain state-of-the-art performance. We also provide qualitative insights into the usefulness of the learned grounded representations.', 'pt': 'Modelos de linguagem pré-treinados demonstraram melhorar substancialmente o desempenho em muitas tarefas de linguagem natural. Embora o foco inicial de tais modelos fosse o pré-treinamento em uma única língua, avanços recentes resultaram em métodos de pré-treinamento visual e multilíngue. Neste artigo, combinamos essas duas abordagens para aprender representações multilíngues visualmente fundamentadas. Especificamente, estendemos a modelagem de linguagem de tradução (Lample e Conneau, 2019) com classificação de região mascarada e realizamos pré-treinamento com visão paralela de três vias e corpora de linguagem. Mostramos que, quando ajustados para tradução automática multimodal, esses modelos obtêm desempenho de última geração. Também fornecemos insights qualitativos sobre a utilidade das representações fundamentadas aprendidas.', 'ar': 'لقد ثبت أن نماذج اللغة المدربة مسبقًا تحسن الأداء في العديد من مهام اللغة الطبيعية بشكل كبير. على الرغم من أن التركيز المبكر لمثل هذه النماذج كان التدريب المسبق على لغة واحدة ، إلا أن التطورات الحديثة أدت إلى طرق التدريب المسبق عبر اللغات والبصرية. في هذه الورقة ، قمنا بدمج هاتين الطريقتين لتعلم التمثيلات متعددة اللغات ذات الأسس المرئية. على وجه التحديد ، نقوم بتوسيع نمذجة لغة الترجمة (Lample and Conneau ، 2019) مع تصنيف المنطقة المقنعة وإجراء تدريب مسبق مع رؤية متوازية ثلاثية الاتجاهات ومجموعات لغوية. نوضح أنه عند ضبطها بدقة للترجمة الآلية متعددة الوسائط ، تحصل هذه النماذج على أحدث أداء. نحن نقدم أيضًا رؤى نوعية حول فائدة التمثيلات الأرضية المكتسبة.', 'fr': "Il a été démontré que les modèles linguistiques pré-entraînés améliorent considérablement les performances dans de nombreuses tâches en langage naturel. Bien que ces modèles aient initialement mis l'accent sur la pré-formation en une seule langue, des progrès récents ont donné lieu à des méthodes de pré-formation visuelle et multilingue. Dans cet article, nous combinons ces deux approches pour apprendre des représentations multilingues visuellement ancrées. Plus précisément, nous étendons la modélisation du langage de traduction (Lample et Conneau, 2019) avec une classification des régions masquées et effectuons une pré-formation avec des corpus de vision et de langage parallèles à trois voies. Nous montrons que lorsqu'ils sont affinés pour la traduction automatique multimodale, ces modèles obtiennent des performances de pointe. Nous fournissons également des informations qualitatives sur l'utilité des représentations fondées apprises.", 'es': 'Se ha demostrado que los modelos lingüísticos preentrenados mejoran sustancialmente el rendimiento en muchas tareas del lenguaje natural. Aunque el enfoque inicial de estos modelos fue la capacitación previa en un solo idioma, los avances recientes han dado lugar a métodos de preentrenamiento visual y multilingüe. En este artículo, combinamos estos dos enfoques para aprender representaciones multilingües con base visual. Específicamente, ampliamos el modelado del lenguaje de traducción (Lample y Conneau, 2019) con la clasificación de regiones enmascaradas y realizamos capacitación previa con visión paralela de tres vías y corpus lingüísticos. Demostramos que cuando se ajustan a la traducción automática multimodal, estos modelos obtienen un rendimiento de vanguardia. También proporcionamos información cualitativa sobre la utilidad de las representaciones fundamentadas aprendidas.', 'ja': '事前に訓練された言語モデルは、多くの自然言語タスクのパフォーマンスを実質的に改善することが示されている。このようなモデルの初期の焦点は単一言語の事前トレーニングでしたが、近年の進歩により、クロスリンガルおよび視覚的な事前トレーニング方法が生まれました。この論文では、視覚的にグラウンディングされたクロスリンガル表現を学ぶために、これら2つのアプローチを組み合わせています。具体的には、マスクされた領域分類を用いた翻訳言語モデリング（ Lample and Conneau, 2019 ）を拡張し、3方向並列ビジョンと言語体を用いた事前トレーニングを実施します。マルチモーダル機械翻訳用に微調整すると、これらのモデルは最先端のパフォーマンスを得ることが示されています。また、学習されたグラウンディングされた表現の有用性について定性的な洞察を提供します。', 'hi': 'पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल को कई प्राकृतिक भाषा कार्यों में प्रदर्शन में काफी सुधार करने के लिए दिखाया गया है। हालांकि इस तरह के मॉडल का प्रारंभिक फोकस एकल भाषा पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण था, हाल ही में हुई प्रगति के परिणामस्वरूप क्रॉस-लिंगुअल और दृश्य पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण विधियां हुई हैं। इस पेपर में, हम नेत्रहीन-आधारित क्रॉस-लिंगुअल प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए इन दो दृष्टिकोणों को जोड़ते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम नकाबपोश क्षेत्र वर्गीकरण के साथ अनुवाद भाषा मॉडलिंग (लैम्पल और कोनेउ, 2019) का विस्तार करते हैं और तीन-तरफ़ा समानांतर दृष्टि और भाषा निगम के साथ पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि जब मल्टीमॉडल मशीन अनुवाद के लिए ठीक-ठीक ट्यून किया जाता है, तो ये मॉडल अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करते हैं। हम सीखा आधारित अभ्यावेदन की उपयोगिता में गुणात्मक अंतर्दृष्टि भी प्रदान करते हैं।', 'zh': '预训语言模形已验大大提高多自然语言任之性。 虽早重单语言预训练,近进致跨言视训练方法。 本文中,合此二法以学之。 具体来说以屏蔽类广译言建模(LampleConneau,2019)以三向并视语料库预训练之。 当针多模态机器翻译微调,先得其性。 示以有用性定性见。', 'ru': 'Было показано, что предварительно обученные языковые модели значительно улучшают результаты во многих задачах естественного языка. Хотя на начальном этапе основное внимание в таких моделях уделялось предварительному обучению на одном языке, в результате недавних достижений были разработаны межязыковые и визуальные методы предварительного обучения. В этой статье мы объединяем эти два подхода для изучения визуально обоснованных кросс-лингвистических представлений. В частности, мы расширяем моделирование языка перевода (Lample и Conneau, 2019) с классификацией скрытых регионов и проводим предварительное обучение с трехсторонним параллельным зрением и языковыми корпусами. Показано, что при точной настройке для мультимодального машинного перевода эти модели получают самые современные характеристики. Мы также даем качественное представление о полезности полученных обоснованных представлений.', 'ga': 'Léiríodh go gcuireann múnlaí teanga réamhoilte feabhas suntasach ar fheidhmíocht i gcuid mhór tascanna teanga nádúrtha. Cé gur réamhoiliúint aonteangach a dhírigh samhlacha dá leithéid go luath, tá modhanna réamhoiliúna trasteangacha agus físiúla mar thoradh ar an dul chun cinn a rinneadh le déanaí. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid an dá chur chuige seo le chéile chun léiriúcháin thrasteangacha atá bunaithe ar fhís a fhoghlaim. Go sonrach, déanaimid an samhaltú teanga aistriúcháin (Lample agus Conneau, 2019) a leathnú le haicmiú réigiún folaithe agus déanaimid réamhoiliúint le fís chomhthreomhar trí bhealach agus corpora teanga. Léirímid nuair a dhéantar mionchoigeartú d’aistriúchán meaisín ilmhódach, go n-éiríonn leis na samhlacha seo feidhmíocht den scoth. Cuirimid léargais cháilíochtúla ar fáil freisin ar úsáideacht na léiriú bunaithe ar fhoghlaim.', 'hu': 'Az előképzett nyelvi modellek számos természetes nyelvi feladat teljesítményét jelentősen javítják. Bár az ilyen modellek korai középpontjában az egynyelvű előképzés volt, a közelmúltban előrelépések eredményeképpen többnyelvű és vizuális előképzési módszereket eredményeztek. Ebben a tanulmányban ezt a két megközelítést kombináljuk, hogy vizuálisan alapuló, nyelvi ábrázolásokat tanuljunk. Konkrétan kiterjesztjük a fordítási nyelv modellezését (Lample és Conneau, 2019) maszkos régiók osztályozásával, és előképzést végezünk három irányú párhuzamos látással és nyelvi corporákkal. Megmutatjuk, hogy a multimodális gépi fordításhoz finomhangolt modellek korszerű teljesítményt érnek el. Minőségi betekintést nyújtunk a tanult alapozott reprezentációk hasznosságába is.', 'ka': 'პირველ განსწავლებული ენის მოდელები ჩვენებულია, რომ მრავალური ენის დავალებაში მნიშვნელოვანება უფრო მეტი. მაგრამ ასეთი მოდელების წინ ფონსკური იყო ერთი ენის წინ განაკლება, მაგრამ ახალი პროგრესი გავაკეთეთ მრავალური და ვიზუალური წინ განაკლების მეტისებში. ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ ამ ორი გახსნა გადავისწავლოთ ვიზუალურად მრავალური გამოსახულება. განსაკუთრებულად, ჩვენ შევცვალობთ ენის მოდელირება (Lample and Conneau, 2019) მაქსიკური რეგიონის კლასიფიკაციაზე და სამუშაო პარალელი ხედის და ენის კოპორაზე გავაკეთებთ სამუშაო განა ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ როცა მულტიმოდიალური მანქანის გაგრძელებისთვის სწორად დააკეთებულია, ეს მოდელები მიიღებენ მსოფლიოს გაგრძელება. ჩვენ ასევე კვალგატიტური მონაცემებით გავაკეთებთ სწავლილი სამყაროებელობას.', 'el': 'Τα προ-εκπαιδευμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα έχουν αποδειχθεί ότι βελτιώνουν σημαντικά την απόδοση σε πολλές εργασίες φυσικής γλώσσας. Παρά το γεγονός ότι το αρχικό επίκεντρο αυτών των μοντέλων ήταν η προ-κατάρτιση μίας γλώσσας, οι πρόσφατες προόδοι έχουν οδηγήσει σε γλωσσικές και οπτικές μεθόδους προεκπαίδευσης. Σε αυτή την εργασία, συνδυάζουμε αυτές τις δύο προσεγγίσεις για να μάθουμε οπτικά θεμελιωμένες διασταυρούμενες αναπαραστάσεις. Συγκεκριμένα, επεκτείνουμε την μοντελοποίηση γλωσσών μετάφρασης (και Κονώ, 2019) με την ταξινόμηση μασκαρισμένης περιοχής και διεξάγουμε προεκπαίδευση με τριπλή παράλληλη όραση στα σώματα γλωσσών. Δείχνουμε ότι όταν τελειοποιηθούν για πολυμορφική μηχανική μετάφραση, αυτά τα μοντέλα αποκτούν επιδόσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας. Παρέχουμε επίσης ποιοτικές γνώσεις σχετικά με τη χρησιμότητα των μαθημένων θεμελιωμένων αναπαραστάσεων.', 'it': "I modelli linguistici pre-formati hanno dimostrato di migliorare notevolmente le prestazioni in molte attività linguistiche naturali. Sebbene l'attenzione iniziale di tali modelli fosse stata rivolta alla pre-formazione linguistica singola, i recenti progressi hanno portato a metodi di pre-formazione linguistica e visiva cross-lingual. In questo articolo, combiniamo questi due approcci per imparare rappresentazioni cross-linguali visivamente fondate. In particolare, estendiamo la modellazione del linguaggio di traduzione (Lample e Conneau, 2019) con classificazione delle regioni mascherate ed eseguiamo pre-formazione con visione parallela a tre vie e corpora del linguaggio. Dimostriamo che quando vengono perfezionati per la traduzione automatica multimodale, questi modelli ottengono prestazioni all'avanguardia. Forniamo anche approfondimenti qualitativi sull'utilità delle rappresentazioni fondate apprese.", 'kk': 'Алдын- ала оқылған тіл үлгілері көптеген тәуелді тіл тапсырмаларында жақсарту үшін көрсетілді. Бұл үлгілердің басында бір тіл алдын- оқыту болғанда, жаңа жағдайлар тілдерді көптеген және визуалдық алдын- оқыту әдістерін көрсетті. Бұл қағазда, біз бұл екі жағдайды көрініс түрлі тілдердің біріктіру үшін біріктіреміз. Сәйкес, біз аудармалы тілдерді моделлеу (Lample and Conneau, 2019) үш жол параллель көрініс және тіл корпорасы арқылы қалқан аудармаларды (Lample and Conneau, 2019). Біз көптеген машинаның аудармаларына жақсы бапталғанда, бұл үлгілер өзгертілген күй- жағдайын жасайды. Біз сондай-ақ білім берілген тұрақтардың пайдаланушылығын көңіл түсіндіреміз.', 'ml': 'മുമ്പ് പരിശീലന ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d വളരെ സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ ജോലികളില്\u200d പ്രകടനം മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുവാന്\u200d കാണിച്ചിരിക് ഇത്തരം മോഡലുകളുടെ ആദ്യത്തെ ഫോക്സോക്സ് ഒരേ ഭാഷ മുന്നില്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കുന്നതായിരുന്നെങ്കിലും, അടുത്ത പുരോഗങ്ങള്\u200d ക്രിസ്ലിങ്ക ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ രണ്ട് സാധാരണങ്ങളെ കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. കാഴ്ചകളില്\u200d ഭാഷയിലെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കാ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നു. ലാമ്പിളും കോണിയൂ, 2019 മുഖ്യഭാഗത്തെ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കേഷനുമായി മുന്നോട്ട് പരിശീലനം നടത്തു നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് പല്ലിമോഡാല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുമ്പോള്\u200d ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200d കാണിക്കും നമ്മളും പഠിക്കുന്നവരുടെ സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രയോജനപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d കൂട', 'mt': 'Intwera li mudelli lingwistiċi mħarrġa minn qabel itejbu l-prestazzjoni f’ħafna kompiti lingwistiċi naturali b’mod sostanzjali. Although the early focus of such models was single language pre-training, recent advances have resulted in cross-lingual and visual pre-training methods.  F’dan id-dokument, aħna ngħaqdu dawn iż-żewġ approċċi biex nitgħallmu rappreżentazzjonijiet interlingwistiċi b’bażi viżwali. Speċifikament, aħna jestendu l-mudell tal-lingwa tat-traduzzjoni (Lample u Conneau, 2019) bil-klassifikazzjoni tar-reġjun maskrat u nagħmlu taħriġ minn qabel b’viżjoni parallela u korpra tal-lingwa bi tliet direzzjonijiet. Aħna nuru li meta jiġu aġġustati għal traduzzjoni multimodali tal-magni, dawn il-mudelli jiksbu prestazzjoni avvanzata. Aħna nipprovdu wkoll għarfien kwalitattiv dwar l-utilità tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet miksuba bbażati.', 'mk': 'Се покажа дека предобучените јазички модели значително ја подобруваат резултатот на многу природни јазични задачи. Although the early focus of such models was single language pre-training, recent advances have resulted in cross-lingual and visual pre-training methods.  Во овој весник, ги комбинираме овие два пристапи за да научиме визуелно основани прекујазични претставувања. Специфично, го прошируваме моделирањето на преведувачкиот јазик (Lample and Conneau, 2019) со маскирана регионална класификација и изведуваме предобука со тринасочна паралелна визија и јазички корпора. We show that when fine-tuned for multimodal machine translation, these models obtain state-of-the-art performance.  We also provide qualitative insights into the usefulness of the learned grounded representations.', 'ms': 'Pre-trained language models have been shown to improve performance in many natural language tasks substantially.  Although the early focus of such models was single language pre-training, recent advances have resulted in cross-lingual and visual pre-training methods.  Dalam kertas ini, kita menggabungkan kedua-dua pendekatan ini untuk belajar perwakilan saling bahasa secara visual. Specifically, we extend the translation language modelling (Lample and Conneau, 2019) with masked region classification and perform pre-training with three-way parallel vision & language corpora.  Kami menunjukkan bahawa apabila disesuaikan untuk terjemahan mesin multimodal, model ini mendapat prestasi state-of-the-art. We also provide qualitative insights into the usefulness of the learned grounded representations.', 'pl': 'Wykazano, że wstępnie przeszkolone modele językowe znacznie poprawiają wydajność w wielu zadaniach języka naturalnego. Chociaż wcześniej takie modele koncentrowały się na przedszkoleniu jednojęzycznym, ostatnie postępy doprowadziły do zastosowania metod przedszkoleniowych między językami i wizualnymi. W niniejszym artykule łączymy te dwa podejścia do nauki wizualnie uziemionych reprezentacji wielojęzycznych. W szczególności rozszerzamy modelowanie języków tłumaczeniowych (Lample i Conneau, 2019) o klasyfikację maskowaną regionów oraz przeprowadzamy szkolenia wstępne z trójkątowym równoległym widzeniem korpusów językowych. Pokazujemy, że po dostrojeniu do multimodalnego tłumaczenia maszynowego modele te uzyskują najnowocześniejszą wydajność. Zapewniamy również jakościowy wgląd na przydatność nauczonych uziemionych reprezentacji.', 'lt': 'Nustatyta, kad iš anksto parengti kalbų modeliai gerokai pagerina daugelio gamtinių kalbų užduočių rezultatus. Nors pirmasis tokių modelių dėmesys buvo skiriamas vienakalbiniam parengiamajam mokymui, pastarojo meto pažanga lėmė tarpkalbinius ir vizualinius parengiamojo mokymo metodus. In this paper, we combine these two approaches to learn visually-grounded cross-lingual representations.  Konkrečiai mes išplečiame vertimo kalbų modeliavimą (Lample ir Conneau, 2019 m.) su paslėpta regiono klasifikacija ir atliekame išankstinį mokymą su trikryptiniu lygiagrečiu regėjimu ir kalbos korpra. Mes rodome, kad kai šie modeliai yra patobulinti daugiarūšio mašinų vertimui, jie įgyja moderniausius rezultatus. Taip pat teikiame kokybinę informaciją apie įgytų pagrįstų atstovybių naudingumą.', 'ro': 'S-a demonstrat că modelele lingvistice pre-instruite îmbunătățesc considerabil performanța în multe sarcini de limbă naturală. Deși accentul timpuriu al acestor modele a fost pregătirea unei singure limbi, progresele recente au dus la metode de pregătire translingvistică și vizuală. În această lucrare, combinăm aceste două abordări pentru a învăța reprezentări cross-lingvistice bazate vizual. Mai exact, extindem modelarea limbilor de traducere (Lample și Conneau, 2019) cu clasificarea regiunilor mascate și efectuăm pre-training cu viziune paralelă în trei căi și corpore lingvistice. Aratăm că atunci când sunt reglate fin pentru traducerea automată multimodală, aceste modele obțin performanțe de ultimă generație. De asemenea, oferim perspective calitative asupra utilității reprezentărilor bazate pe învățături.', 'sr': 'Pokazani su predobučeni jezički modeli kako bi značajno poboljšali učinkovitost u mnogim prirodnim jezičkim zadacima. Iako je rani fokus takvih modela bio predobuka jednog jezika, nedavni napredak rezultirao je međujezičkim i vizualnim metodama predobuke. U ovom papiru kombiniramo ove dve pristupe da naučimo vizualno osnovane cross-lingual representations. Posebno, proširimo modelling jezika prevoda (Lample and Conneau, 2019) sa klasifikacijom maskiranog regiona i obavljamo predobuku sa trosmjernim paralelnim vizijskim i jezičkim korporama. Pokazujemo da, kada se ispravljamo za multimodalni prevod mašine, ovi modeli dobijaju nastup umjetnosti. Takođe pružamo kvalitativne uvide u korisnost naučenih temeljnih predstavljanja.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරධානය කළ භාෂා මොඩල් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ස්වභාවික භාෂා වැඩේ වැඩ කරන්න. ඒ වගේම මොඩල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරධානයක් තියෙන්නේ එකම භාෂාව ප්\u200dරධානයක් තියෙන්නේ නමුත්, අලුත් ප්\u200dරධානයක් විශාල මේ පත්තරේ අපි මේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය දෙකක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා දිහා ප්\u200dරවේශනයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න. විශේෂයෙන්, අපි වාර්ථාව භාෂාව මඩේලින් කරන්න (ලැම්ප්ල් සහ කොන්නේව්, 2019) සමග මුහුණු ප්\u200dරදේශය වාර්ථාව සමග ප්\u200dරධානය කරන අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ඒක ගොඩක් මැෂින් වාර්ථාව සඳහා හොඳින් සැකසුම් කලොත්, මේ මොඩේල්ස් සැකසුම් ස්ථානය- අපි ඉගෙන ගත්ත ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන වලට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා.', 'so': "Tusaalada afka hore ee horay lagu baray waxaa loo muujiyey inuu horumariyo bandhigyada shaqooyinka luuqadaha asalka ah. In kastoo ay horumarinta ugu horeeyay tusaalahaas uu ahaa waxbarasho-horaadka oo kaliya, horumarinta ugu dambeeyayna waxay sababtay qaabab luqada kala duwan iyo waxbarasho horumar ah. Qoraalkan waxaynu isku daryeelaynaa labadan qaab ah si aan u barno wakiilada luuqadaha aad aragtida ku qoran. Si gaar ah, waxaynu ku fidinnaa muuqashada afka turjumaadda (Lample and Conneau, 2019) oo ku qoran barashada gobolka maskaxda, waxaana sameynaa waxbarasho horumar ah oo ku qoran muuqashada saddex jid oo lambarka ah iyo shirkadda afka. Waxan tusnaynaa in marka lagu turjumo qalabka badan, tusaalahan waxay heli karaan bandhigyada farshaxanka. Sidoo kale waxaynu waxyaabaha ay faa'iido u leedahay kuwa lagu baray xarunta.", 'sv': 'Förutbildade språkmodeller har visat sig förbättra prestandan i många naturliga språkuppgifter avsevärt. Även om dessa modeller tidigt fokuserade på fortbildning av ett enskilt språk, har de senaste framstegen resulterat i tvärspråkiga och visuella fortbildningsmetoder. I denna uppsats kombinerar vi dessa två tillvägagångssätt för att lära oss visuellt grundade tvärspråkliga representationer. Specifikt utökar vi översättningsspråksmodelleringen (Lample och Conneau, 2019) med maskerad regionklassificering och genomför fortbildning med trevägs parallell vision & språkcorpora. Vi visar att när de finjusteras för multimodal maskinöversättning får dessa modeller toppmoderna prestanda. Vi ger också kvalitativa insikter i nyttan av de lärda grundade representationerna.', 'ta': 'முன்பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரிகள் பல இயல்பான மொழி பணிகளில் செயல்பாட்டை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு காட்டப்பட்டுள்ளது. இந்த மாதிரிகளின் முதல் கவனம் ஒரே மொழி முன் பயிற்சியில் இருந்தாலும், சமீபத்தில் முன்னேற்றம் மொழி மற்றும் காட்சி முன் பயிற்சி  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் இந்த இரண்டு வழிகளை ஒன்றிணைக்கிறோம் பார்வையில் உள்ள மொழிகளின் குறிப்பிடுகளை கற்று குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மாதிரி மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரி மூடப்பட்ட பகுதி வகைப்புடன் (Lample and Conneau, 2019) மூடப்பட்ட மூன்று வழி ஒத்த பார்வை  பல்கலை இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பிற்கு நன்றாக தெரியும் போது, இந்த மாதிரிகள் கலை செயல்பாடு நிலையை பெறுகிறது. நாம் கற்றுக் கொண்டிருக்கும் அடிப்படையின் குறிப்புகளின் பயன்பாட்டிற்கும் குறிப்புணர்வுகள', 'mn': 'Өмнөх сургалтын хэл загварууд нь байгалийн хэл даалгаврын үйл ажиллагааг ихэвчлэн сайжруулах боломжтой болсон. Ийм загварын эхний анхаарлын төвлөрөл нь хэлний өмнө сургалтын тулд, саяхан хөгжлийн талаар олон хэл болон харааны алдын сургалтын арга барилгыг харуулсан. Энэ цаасан дээр бид эдгээр хоёр арга замыг хараад хэлний олон хэлний илэрхийллийг суралцахын тулд нэгтгэдэг. Ялангуяа бид хэл хэлний моделийг (Лампл болон Коннеу, 2019) хэсгийг дүрслэж, гурван аргаар параллел харагдах болон хэл корпораттай урд сургалтыг хийдэг. Бид олон моделийн машины хөрөнгө оруулах үед эдгээр загварууд урлагийн үйл ажиллагаа гаргадаг. Мөн бид сургалтын сургалтын үзүүлэлтийн хэрэгцээ болох чадвартай ойлголт өгдөг.', 'no': 'Førehandsvis språk-modeller er viste for å forbetra utviklinga i mange naturspråk-oppgåver for stort storleik. Selv om tidlegare fokus på slike modeller var enkelt språk før trening, har tidlegare avanserte resultat i fleirspråk og visuelle før trening. I denne papiret kombinerer vi desse to tilnærmingane for å lære visuelt krysspråk representasjonar. Spesielt utvidar vi omsetjingspråk- modellen (Lample and Conneau, 2019) med maskerte regionalklassifikasjon og utfør føreøving med tre måtar parallelle vising og språk- korpora. Vi viser at når det er fint oppsett for multimodal maskinsomsetjing, får disse modelane tilstanden av kunsten. Vi tilbyr også kvalitative opplysningar i den nyttigheten av dei lærte grunnlagte representasjonane.', 'ur': 'پہلے کی تعلیم کی زبان موڈل دکھائی گئی ہے کہ بہت سی طبیعی زبان کے کاموں میں فعالیت اچھی طرح اچھی طرح کرے۔ اگرچہ اس طرح کی پہلی موڈل کی تدبیر ایک زبان سے پہلے کی تھی، اچھی پیشرفت کی وجہ سے مختلف زبان اور تصویر پیش تدبیر کی طریقے کی وجہ سے ہوئی ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم ان دو طریقوں کو ترکیب دیتے ہیں کہ visually-grounded cross-lingual representations کی تعلیم کریں. خاص طور پر، ہم ترجمہ زبان کی موڈلینگ (Lample and Conneau, 2019) کو ماسک کے منطقه کی کلاسیفوں کے ساتھ پھیلاتے ہیں اور تین طریقے کے سامنے سامنے نظر اور زبان کی کوروں کے ساتھ پیش آموزش کرتے ہیں۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ جب ملتی موڈال ماشین کی ترجمہ کے لئے بہترین تنظیم کیے جاتے ہیں، ان موڈلوں کو موجود آرتی کی فعالیت حاصل کرتا ہے۔ ہم نے بھی تعلیم یاد رکھنے والی نمونات کے فائدہ کے لئے گواہی دینے والی بصیرت دیتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Taʼminlovchi tillar modellari ko'pchilik tabiiy tillar vazifalarida bajarishni oshirish uchun ko'rsatilgan. Agar bu modellarning birinchi fokusi bir tildan oldin o'rganishga ega bo'lgan bo'lsa, yaqinda taʼminlovchilar bir tillar va ko'rinish oldin usullari sababdi. Bu qogʻozda biz bu ikkita usulni ko'p tillarda qo'shilga o'rganish uchun birlashtiramiz. Ko'rsatilgan, biz tarjima tilning modelligini (Lamp va Conneau, 2019) qo'yish maydoni darajalashtirish bilan uzatimiz va uchta yo'nalik koʻrinish va tillar kompaniyasi bilan pre-training bajaramiz. Biz ko'pchilik mashinalar tarjima qilayotganda, bu modellar shu shaxsiy ishni bajaradi. Biz o'rganilgan tashkilotlarning foydalanishiga taqlik qilamiz.", 'vi': 'Đã có những mô hình ngôn ngữ được dạy trước đã cải thiện hiệu quả trong nhiều nhiệm vụ ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Mặc dù đầu tiên các mô hình này là tập trung ngôn ngữ duy nhất trước khi đào tạo, nhưng tiến bộ gần đây đã dẫn đến phương pháp giáo dục xuyên ngôn ngữ và hình ảnh. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta kết hợp hai phương pháp này để học các biểu tượng chữ chung. Cụ thể, chúng tôi mở rộng mô hình ngôn ngữ dịch (Lample and Conneau, 2009) với mức phân tích khu vực đeo mặt nạ và thực hiện khóa huấn luyện trước tiên với khả năng nhìn song song song... ngôn ngữ thể. Chúng tôi cho thấy khi chỉnh sửa cho máy dịch chuyển đa phương, các mô hình này đạt được trình độ tuyệt vời. Chúng tôi cũng cung cấp về khác năng lượng của các biết diễn biết được cung cấp.', 'bg': 'Доказано е, че предварително обучените езикови модели подобряват значително ефективността при много задачи по естествен език. Въпреки че ранният фокус на тези модели беше предобучение на един език, последните постижения доведоха до междуезични и визуални методи за предобучение. В тази статия комбинираме тези два подхода, за да научим визуално обосновани междуезични представи. По-конкретно разширяваме моделирането на езика на превода (Лампъл и Коно, 2019) с класификация на маскирани региони и извършваме предварителна подготовка с трипосочни паралелни визуални и езикови корпуси. Показваме, че когато са фина настройка за мултимодален машинен превод, тези модели получават най-съвременно изпълнение. Ние също така предоставяме качествени прозрения за полезността на научените обосновани представи.', 'da': 'Forududdannede sprogmodeller har vist sig at forbedre ydeevnen i mange naturlige sprogopgaver betydeligt. Selv om disse modeller tidligt fokuserede på enkeltsproget foruddannelse, har de seneste fremskridt resulteret i tværsprogede og visuelle foruddannelsesmetoder. I denne artikel kombinerer vi disse to tilgange til at lære visuelt grundede tværsprogede repræsentationer. Specielt udvider vi oversættelsessprogmodelleringen (Lample og Conneau, 2019) med maskeret regionsklassificering og udfører forudgående træning med trevejs parallelvision og sprogkorpora. Vi viser, at når de finjusteres til multimodal maskinoversættelse, opnår disse modeller topmoderne ydeevne. Vi giver også kvalitativ indsigt i nytten af de lærte grundlæggende repræsentationer.', 'hr': 'Pokazani su predobučeni jezički modeli kako bi se značajno poboljšali učinkovitost u mnogim prirodnim jezičkim zadacima. Iako je rani fokus takvih modela bio predobuka jednog jezika, nedavni napredak rezultirao je međujezičkim i vizualnim metodama predobuke. U ovom papiru kombiniramo ove dvije pristupe da naučimo vizualno temeljene cross-jezičke predstave. Posebno, proširimo modelling jezika prevođenja (Lample i Conneau, 2019.) sa klasifikacijom maskiranog regija i obavljamo predobuku s trosmjernom paralelnom vizijskom i jezičkom tijelom. Pokazujemo da, kada se dobro uključimo za multimodalni prevod strojeva, ovi modeli dobijaju nastup umjetnosti. Također pružamo kvalitativne uvide o korisnosti učenih temeljnih predstavljanja.', 'id': 'Model bahasa yang terlatih telah menunjukkan untuk meningkatkan prestasi dalam banyak tugas bahasa alam secara konsideral. Meskipun fokus awal dari model tersebut adalah prapelatihan bahasa tunggal, kemajuan baru-baru ini telah mengakibatkan metode prapelatihan saling bahasa dan visual. Dalam kertas ini, kita menggabungkan kedua pendekatan ini untuk belajar representation saling bahasa secara visual. Specifically, we extend the translation language modelling (Lample and Conneau, 2019) with masked region classification and perform pre-training with three-way parallel vision & language corpora.  We show that when fine-tuned for multimodal machine translation, these models obtain state-of-the-art performance.  We also provide qualitative insights into the usefulness of the learned grounded representations.', 'ko': '예비 훈련을 거친 언어 모델은 이미 많은 자연 언어 임무의 성능을 현저하게 향상시킬 수 있다는 것이 증명되었다.이런 모델의 초기 중점은 단일 언어의 예비 훈련이었지만 최근의 진전은 언어와 시각을 뛰어넘는 예비 훈련 방법을 초래했다.본고에서 우리는 이 두 가지 방법을 결합시켜 시각적 기초의 크로스 언어 표징을 배운다.구체적으로 우리는 복면 영역 분류를 사용하여 번역 언어 모델링(Lample과 Conneau, 2019)을 확장하고 삼방향 평행 시각과 언어 자료 라이브러리를 사용하여 예비 훈련을 실시한다.우리는 다중모드 기계 번역을 미세하게 조정할 때 이런 모형들은 가장 선진적인 성능을 얻을 수 있음을 나타낸다.우리는 또 배운 기초 표징의 유용성에 대한 정성적인 견해를 제공했다.', 'nl': 'Vooropgeleide taalmodellen hebben aangetoond dat ze de prestaties van veel natuurlijke taaltaken aanzienlijk verbeteren. Hoewel de eerste focus van dergelijke modellen op eentalige pre-training lag, hebben recente ontwikkelingen geleid tot meertalige en visuele pre-trainingsmethoden. In dit artikel combineren we deze twee benaderingen om visueel gegronde cross-lingual representaties te leren. Specifiek breiden we de vertaaltaalmodellering (Lample en Conneau, 2019) uit met gemaskeerde regio-classificatie en voeren we pre-training uit met drie-weg parallelle visie op taalcorpora. We laten zien dat deze modellen, wanneer ze worden verfijnd voor multimodale machinevertaling, state-of-the-art prestaties krijgen. Ook geven we kwalitatieve inzichten in het nut van de aangeleerde geaarde representaties.', 'fa': 'مدلهای پیش آموزش زبان نشون داده شده که عملکرد در بسیاری از کار زبان طبیعی بیشتر بهتر شود. اگرچه تمرکز اولین مدلها پیش آموزش زبانی تنها بود، پیشرفتهای اخیر به وسیله روش پیش آموزش های مختلف زبان و دیدگاه نتیجه داده اند. در این کاغذ، ما این دو روش را برای یاد گرفتن نمایش\u200cهای متفاوت زبان\u200cهای دیدگانی ترکیب می\u200cکنیم. به طور خاص، ما مدل\u200cسازی زبان ترجمه (Lample and Conneau, 2019) را با منطقه\u200cی ماسک\u200cسازی گسترش می\u200cدهیم و پیش\u200cآموزش می\u200cکنیم با یک شرکت دیدگاه و زبان\u200cسازی سه راه متفاوت. ما نشان می دهیم که وقتی برای ترجمه ماشین های زیادی تنظیم شده، این مدلها اجرای موقعیت هنری را می گیرند. ما همچنین مشاهده\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای را در مورد استفاده از نمایش\u200cهای پایه\u200cای یاد گرفته\u200cایم.', 'de': 'Vortrainierte Sprachmodelle verbessern nachweislich die Leistung vieler natürlicher Sprachaufgaben erheblich. Obwohl der frühe Fokus solcher Modelle auf einsprachige Vortrainings lag, haben jüngste Fortschritte zu sprachübergreifenden und visuellen Vortrainingsmethoden geführt. In diesem Beitrag kombinieren wir diese beiden Ansätze, um visuell fundierte sprachübergreifende Repräsentationen zu lernen. Konkret erweitern wir die Übersetzungssprachenmodellierung (Lample und Conneau, 2019) um maskierte Regionsklassifikation und führen Vortrainings mit dreiseitiger paralleler Sicht von Sprachkorpora durch. Wir zeigen, dass diese Modelle, wenn sie für die multimodale maschinelle Übersetzung optimiert werden, auf dem neuesten Stand der Technik sind. Wir geben auch qualitative Einblicke in die Nützlichkeit der erlernten geerdeten Repräsentationen.', 'tr': 'Öňki bilimden öňki dil nusgalary tebigy dil täzeliklerinde gowurak etmek üçin görkezildi. Şol nusgalaryň irräk üns öňünden birinji dil öňünden okuwçysy bolsa-da soňky öňki gelişmeler çapda dil we görsel öňünden öňünden okuwçysy däldir. Bu kağıtda görsel edilmiş çarpı dil temsillerini öwrenmek üçin bu iki gollaşmayı birleştirdik. Adatça, biz terjime dili modellerini (Lample and Conneau, 2019) masker bölegi klasifikasy bilen genişletip üç ýoluň parallel görnüş we dil korporasy bilen öň-okuwçy edip ýöredirik. Biz multimodal maşynyň terjimesi üçin gowy düzüldigini görkeýäs. Bu nusgalar möhüm-sanat eserleşigini başarýarlar. Biz hem özümize görkezilýän temsilleriň ulanylygyna meňzeşlik pikirlerini berýäris.', 'sq': 'Pre-trained language models have been shown to improve performance in many natural language tasks substantially.  Although the early focus of such models was single language pre-training, recent advances have resulted in cross-lingual and visual pre-training methods.  In this paper, we combine these two approaches to learn visually-grounded cross-lingual representations.  Veçanërisht, ne zgjerojmë modelimin e gjuhës përkthimi (Lample dhe Conneau, 2019) me klasifikimin e rajonit të maskuar dhe kryejmë përpara-trajnimin me vizion paralel tre-drejtor dhe korpra gjuhësh. Ne tregojmë se kur të rregullohen për përkthimin multimodal të makinave, këto modele fitojnë shfaqje më të larta. Ne gjithashtu ofrojmë pamje kualitative në dobinë e përfaqësimeve të mësuara të bazuara.', 'sw': 'Pre-trained language models have been shown to improve performance in many natural language tasks substantially.  Ingawa mtazamo wa mwanzo wa mifano hiyo ulikuwa ni mafunzo ya lugha moja kabla ya mafunzo, maendeleo ya hivi karibuni yamesababisha njia za kupitia lugha na kuona mafunzo ya awali. Katika karatasi hii, tunaunganisha mbinu hizi ili kujifunza uwakilishi wa lugha yenye msingi wa kuona. Kwa ujumla, tunaongeza mifano ya lugha ya tafsiri (Lample na Conneau, 2019) kwa usambazaji wa eneo hilo na kutekeleza mafunzo ya awali kwa maono matatu yanayofanana na makampuni ya lugha. Tunaonyesha kwamba pale tunapowekwa vizuri kwa kutafsiri mashine nyingi, mifano hii hupata hali ya utendaji wa sanaa. We also provide qualitative insights into the usefulness of the learned grounded representations.', 'af': 'Vorige opgelei taal modele is vertoon om uitvoerings in baie natuurlike taal opdragte te beter te maak. Alhoewel die vroeër fokus van sodanige modele was enkele taal voor-onderwerp, het onlangse voorwerp gevolg in kruistale en visuele voor-onderwerp metodes. In hierdie papier, kombinieer ons hierdie twee toegang om visualiseer-grond kruistale voorstellings te leer. Spesifieke, ons uitbrei die vertaling taal modellering (Lample and Conneau, 2019) met maskeerde regionale klasifikasie en uitvoer voor- onderwerp met drie maniere parallele visie en taal korpora. Ons wys dat wanneer vir multimodaal masjien vertaling gevind is, hierdie modele verkry staat-van-kuns-prestasie. Ons verskaf ook kvalitatiewe insigs in die bruikbaarheid van die geleerde georgronderde voorstellings.', 'am': 'የቀድሞው የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች በአካባቢ ቋንቋ ስራዎችን ለማሻሻል ታይተዋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የዚህ ዓይነቶች መጀመሪያ ምሳሌ አንዲት ቋንቋ በፊት ትምህርት ቢሆን፣ የቀድሞው ግንኙነት የቋንቋ ቋንቋ እና የፊተኛ ትምህርት ልማድ ሆኖአል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ እነዚህን ሁለቱን የቋንቋዎች መልዕክቶች ለመማር እናሳስባለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ የቋንቋውን ትርጉም ምሳሌ (Lample እና Conneau, 2019) በመስፈሪያው ክፍል እና በሦስት መንገድ በተያያያይነት ራእይ እና ቋንቋ ኮርፖርተር በፊት ትምህርት እናደርጋለን፡፡ We show that when fine-tuned for multimodal machine translation, these models obtain state-of-the-art performance.  የተማሩት የመሠረተ መሠረት መልዕክቶችን ለመጠቀም እናስባለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Pre-trained language models have been shown to improve performance in many natural language tasks substantially.  Չնայած նման մոդելների սկզբնական կենտրոնացումը միակ լեզվի նախապատրաստման էր, վերջին անգամ առաջընթացները հանգեցրել են երկլեզվային և վիզուալ նախապատրաստման մեթոդների: In this paper, we combine these two approaches to learn visually-grounded cross-lingual representations.  Հատկապես, մենք ընդլայնում ենք թարգմանման լեզվի մոդելավորումը (Լամպլ և Կոննեո 2019 թվականին) պատկերված տարածաշրջանի դասակարգման հետ և նախապատրաստում ենք երեք ուղղությամբ զուգահեռ տեսողության և լեզվի կոպորա հետ We show that when fine-tuned for multimodal machine translation, these models obtain state-of-the-art performance.  Մենք նաև պարունակում ենք որակային ընկալումներ սովորված հիմնված ներկայացումների օգտակարության մասին:', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষায় প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেল অনেক প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার কাজের প্রভাব উন্নত করার জন্য দেখা যাচ্ছে। যদিও এই মডেলের প্রাথমিক মনোযোগ ছিল এক ভাষা প্রশিক্ষণের পূর্বে, সাম্প্রতিক অগ্রগতি ক্রস-ভাষায় এবং দৃশ্য প্রশিক্ষণের পূর্বের পদ্ধ এই পত্রিকায় আমরা দৃশ্যমান ভিত্তিক ভাষার প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখার জন্য এই দুটি পদক্ষেপ একত্রিত করি। বিশেষ করে, আমরা অনুবাদের ভাষার মডেল বৃদ্ধি করি (ল্যাম্পে এবং কনিউ, ২০১৯) মুখোশিত অঞ্চলের বিভাগের মাধ্যমে প্রশিক্ষণ এবং তিন-পথের প্যারালে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে যখন মাল্টিমোডাল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য ভালোভাবে প্রকাশ করা হয়, তখন এই মডেলগুলো শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রের প্ এছাড়াও আমরা শিক্ষিত ভূমির প্রতিনিধিদের প্রতিনিধিদের কার্যকলাপের ক্ষেত্রে যৌক্তিক দৃষ্টিভ', 'az': 'Əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş dil modelləri çox təbiətli dil işlərində təhsil etmək üçün göstərildilər. Bu modellərin ilk təhsil təhsil edilməsindən əvvəl təhsil edilməsindən əvvəl təhsil edilməsindən əvvəlki təhsil olaraq, yeni təhsil çoxlu dil və görsel təhsil metodlarına bənzəyir. Bu kağızda, biz bu iki tərəfləri görünümlü dillərlə öyrənmək üçün birləşdiririk. Özellikle, biz qurğulama dilini modelləşdiririk (Lample and Conneau, 2019), maskara bölgesi klasifikasyonu ilə, üç yol parallel görünüş və dil korporası ilə əvvəl təhsil edirik. Biz çoxlu modal maşın çevirilməsi üçün təmizləndikdə bu modellər mövcuddur. Biz həmçinin öyrəndiyimiz təsirlərin faydalanılmasını təmin edirik.', 'ca': "Pre-trained language models have been shown to improve performance in many natural language tasks substantially.  Tot i que el primer foc d'aquests models va ser l'entrenamient en un llenguatge únic, els avanços recents han resultat en mètodes translingüístics i visuals de pré-entrenamient. In this paper, we combine these two approaches to learn visually-grounded cross-lingual representations.  Specifically, we extend the translation language modelling (Lample and Conneau, 2019) with masked region classification and perform pre-training with three-way parallel vision & language corpora.  Ens demostram que quan s'ajusten a la traducció de màquines multimodals, aquests models obtenen el rendiment més avançat. També proporcionem insights qualitatives sobre l'utilitat de les representacions basades aprendides.", 'et': 'On tõestatud, et eelkoolitud keelemudelid parandavad paljude looduskeele ülesannete täitmist oluliselt. Kuigi sellised mudelid keskendusid varasemalt ühekeelsele eelkoolitusele, on hiljutised edusammud viinud keeleüleste ja visuaalsete eelkoolituse meetoditeni. Käesolevas dokumendis ühendame need kaks lähenemisviisi visuaalselt põhjendatud keeleüleste esinduste õppimiseks. Täpsemalt laiendame tõlkekeele modelleerimist (Lample ja Conneau, 2019) maskeeritud piirkondade klassifikatsiooniga ning teostame eelkoolitust kolmesuunalise paralleelse nägemise ja keelekorporatsiooniga. Näitame, et mitmeliigilise masintõlke jaoks täpselt häälestatud mudelid saavutavad tipptasemel jõudluse. Samuti pakume kvalitatiivset ülevaadet õppitud põhjendatud esinduste kasulikkusest.', 'cs': 'Bylo prokázáno, že předškolené jazykové modely výrazně zlepšují výkon v mnoha úkolech přirozeného jazyka. Přestože počáteční zaměření těchto modelů bylo zaměřeno na předškolení jednoho jazyka, nedávné pokroky vedly k metodám předškolení mezi jazyky a vizuální. V tomto článku kombinujeme tyto dva přístupy k učení vizuálně uzemněných křížových reprezentací. Konkrétně rozšiřujeme modelování překladového jazyka (Lample a Conneau, 2019) o klasifikaci maskovaných oblastí a provádíme předškolení s třícestným paralelním viděním jazykových korpusů. Ukazujeme, že při jemném vyladění pro multimodální strojový překlad dosahují tyto modely nejmodernějšího výkonu. Poskytujeme také kvalitativní pohled na užitečnost učených základních reprezentací.', 'fi': 'Esikoulutettujen kielimallien on osoitettu parantavan suorituskykyä monissa luonnonkielitehtävissä merkittävästi. Vaikka tällaisten mallien varhaisessa vaiheessa keskityttiin yhden kielen esikoulutukseen, viimeaikaiset edistysaskeleet ovat johtaneet monikielisiin ja visuaalisiin esikoulutusmenetelmiin. Tässä artikkelissa yhdistämme nämä kaksi lähestymistapaa oppiaksemme visuaalisesti pohjautuvia monikielisiä representaatioita. Laajennamme käännöskielen mallinnusta (Lample ja Conneau, 2019) masked region -luokituksella ja suoritamme esikoulutusta kolmisuuntaisilla rinnakkaisvisio- ja kielikorpusilla. Osoitamme, että multimodaalisia konekäännöksiä varten hienosäädettäessä nämä mallit saavat huippuluokan suorituskykyä. Tarjoamme myös laadullisia oivalluksia opittujen pohjautuvien representaatioiden hyödyllisyydestä.', 'bs': 'Pokazani su predobučeni jezički modeli kako bi značajno poboljšali učinkovitost u mnogim prirodnim jezičkim zadacima. Iako je rani fokus takvih modela bio predobuka jednog jezika, nedavni napredak rezultirao je međujezičkim i vizualnim metodama predobuke. U ovom papiru kombiniramo ove dve pristupe da naučimo vizualno osnovane cross-jezičke predstave. Posebno, proširimo modelling jezika prevoda (Lample and Conneau, 2019) sa klasifikacijom maskiranog regiona i obavljamo predobuku sa trosmjernom paralelnom vizijskom i jezičkom korporacijom. Pokazujemo da, kada se ispravljamo za multimodalni prevod mašine, ovi modeli dobijaju predstavu umjetnosti. Također pružamo kvalitetne uvide o korisnosti naučenih temeljnih predstavljanja.', 'sk': 'Izkazalo se je, da vnaprej usposobljeni jezikovni modeli bistveno izboljšujejo učinkovitost pri številnih nalogah naravnega jezika. Čeprav so se takšni modeli zgodaj osredotočili na predusposabljanje v enem jeziku, so nedavni napredek privedli do medjezičnih in vizualnih metod predusposabljanja. V prispevku združujemo ta dva pristopa za učenje vizualno utemeljenih medjezičnih reprezentacij. Natančneje razširimo modeliranje prevajalskega jezika (Lample in Conneau, 2019) s klasifikacijo maskiranih regij in izvajamo predusposabljanje s trosmernimi vzporednimi vizijskimi in jezikovnimi korpusi. Pokazujemo, da pri natančnem nastavitvi multimodalnega strojnega prevajanja ti modeli dosegajo najsodobnejšo zmogljivost. Zagotavljamo tudi kvalitativne vpoglede v uporabnost učenih utemeljenih predstavitev.', 'he': 'מודלים שפות מאומנים מראש הוראו לשפר את ההופעה במשימות שפות טבעיות רבות באופן משמעותי. למרות שהמרכז המוקדם של דוגמנים כאלה היה שיעור ראשון לשפה אחת, התקדמות האחרונות הובילו לשיטות ראשונות ראשונות ושפתיים. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו משלבים את שתי הגישות האלה כדי ללמוד מייצגים דרך שפתיים מבוססים חזותיים. במיוחד, אנו מארחים את הדוגמנים של שפת התרגום (Lample and Conneau, 2019) עם מסווה אזורית מסווה ומבצעים אימון מראש עם ראייה במקביל שלוש כיוונים וקופורה לשפה. אנחנו מראים שכאשר מתאימים למכונות רבות-מודליות, הדוגמנים האלה מקבלים ביצועים חדשים. אנחנו גם מספקים תובנות איכותיות לתוך השימוש של היציגות המבוססות ללמודות.', 'ha': "An nuna misalin harshen zaman wanda aka tsare shi dõmin ya improve performance cikin aikin masu cikin masu aikin harshen bakwai mai girma. Although the early focus of such models was single language pre-training, recent advances have resulted in cross-lingual and visual pre-training methods.  Ga wannan takardan, Munã haɗa waɗannan hanyoyin biyu dõmin mu sanar masu karatun misalin linguin-bakin da ke gani. Ka ƙayyade, za'a nuna misalin harshen fassarar (Lamp and Conneou, 2019) da fasalin kayan da aka rufe shi kuma Mu yi tafiyar da shirin gaba ɗaya da fasalin gani na uku-way parallel & harshen firma. Tuna nũna cewa idan an yi kyauta ga fassarar masu multi-multi, waɗannan misalin suna da halin-da-art. Kuma Munã bã ta fatawa ga mutane da aka sani.", 'bo': 'སྔོན་འཛིན་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་རྒྱས་གཏོང་། སྔོན་གྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་འདི་དག་བྱ་རིམ་ལྟ་སྟངས་འཛིན་པའི་སྔོན་འཛིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནའང་། འཕེལ་རིམ་མཐོང་སྣེ་ཚོགས་དང་མཐ ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་མཐོང་ལྡན་སྔོན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་མཉམ་བསྡད་ནས་མཐོང་ན་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་དང་། Specifically, we extend the translation language modelling (Lample and Conneau, 2019) with masked region classification and perform pre-training with three-way parallel vision & language corpora. འུ་ཅག་གིས་འདི་ལྟ་བུ ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྩོམ་པ་གཞི་རྩོམ་པ་ལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།', 'jv': 'Sampeyan ingkang dipoleh akeh-perusahaan anyari wis dumateng kanggo ngerasakno nggawe barang langkung bantuan. Nalika iku, ingkang diolangno sistem sing sampeyan mrogram kuwi banjur prelimin, akeh bantuan karo sistem sing berarti bantuan karo ngono kuwi tindakan layar. Nanging alih iki, kita mudhaya karo pawaran kanggo ngerasakno gambar apakno. Jura-Jura, kita gambar kelas telu nggambar tarjamahan Awak dhéwé ngerasakno karo akeh sampeyan kanggo tarjamahan multimodal, model iki dadi bisa dumadhi state-of-the-arts barang. Awak dhéwé éngawe alih perusahaan ingkang dipunanggé kanggo mbatalé awak dhéwé.'}
{'en': 'An Expert Annotated Dataset for the Detection of Online Misogyny', 'fr': 'Un jeu de données annoté par des experts pour la détection de la misogynie en ligne', 'pt': 'Um conjunto de dados anotado por especialistas para a detecção de misoginia online', 'es': 'Un conjunto de datos anotado por expertos para la detección de la misoginia en línea', 'ar': 'مجموعة بيانات مشروحة من الخبراء للكشف عن كراهية النساء عبر الإنترنت', 'hi': 'ऑनलाइन Misogyny का पता लगाने के लिए एक विशेषज्ञ एनोटेट डेटासेट', 'zh': '以检测在线厌女症专家注数集', 'ja': 'オンライン異常を検出するための専門家による注釈付きデータセット', 'ru': 'Экспертный аннотированный набор данных для обнаружения онлайновой мизогинии', 'ga': 'Tacar Sonraí Anótáilte ó Shaineolaí chun Míseolaíocht Ar Líne a Bhrath', 'el': 'Ένα σύνολο δεδομένων με σχόλια εμπειρογνωμόνων για την ανίχνευση της διαδικτυακής μισογυνίας', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Egy szakértő jegyzett adatkészlet az online nőgyűlölet felismeréséhez', 'it': 'Un dataset annotato esperto per il rilevamento della misoginia online', 'kk': 'Name', 'lt': 'Comment', 'ms': 'Name', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d മിസോഗിനിയുടെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d അറിയിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Sett ta’ Dejta Annotat Espert għas-Sejbien tal-Misoġinja Onlajn', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Zestaw danych przeznaczonych do wykrywania mizoginii w Internecie', 'mn': 'Онлайн Misogyny-г олохын тулд мэргэжилтэн анзаарсан өгөгдлийн сан', 'ro': 'Un set de date adnotat de expert pentru detectarea misoginiei online', 'sr': 'Ekspert je najavio datoteku za otkrivanje online misogynije.', 'so': 'Isticmaalka shabakadda', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'En expert kommenterad dataset för upptäckt av misogini online', 'ur': 'Name', 'ta': 'இணைய குறிப்பிட்ட கண்டறியும் தகவல் அமைப்பு', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một tập tin chú thích chuyên gia để phát hiện lỗi mạng mạng', 'nl': 'Een deskundige geannoteerde dataset voor het opsporen van online misogynie', 'hr': 'Ekspert je najavio datum za otkrivanje online misogynije', 'bg': 'Експертен анотиран набор от данни за откриване на онлайн женомраза', 'da': 'Et ekspert kommenteret datasæt til opdagelse af online misogini', 'ko': '온라인 염녀증 검출에 사용되는 전문가 주석 데이터 집합', 'id': 'Sebuah Dataset Penganotasi Ekspert untuk Deteksi Misogini Online', 'de': 'Ein von Experten kommentierter Datensatz zur Erkennung von Online-Misogynie', 'fa': 'Name', 'tr': 'Online Misogyny Aňlamak üçin Eksor Annotated Dataset', 'sw': 'Mpaka wa Takwimu zilizotangazwa kwa ajili ya Kugundua Uonyesho wa Mtandao', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një bazë të dhënash të vënë në dukje ekspert për zbulimin e Misogjinisë në internet', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'az': 'İnternet Misogyny keşirmək üçün xəbərdar edilmiş verilənlər', 'bn': 'অনলাইন মিজোজিনির সনাক্ত করার জন্য একটি বিশেষজ্ঞ ডাটাসেট', 'bs': 'Ekspert je najavio datoteku za otkrivanje online misogynije.', 'hy': 'Comment', 'cs': 'Odborná anotovaná sada dat pro detekci online misogynie', 'ca': 'Un conjunt de dades anotats per a la detecció de la misogínia en línia', 'et': 'Ekspertide annoteeritud andmekogum online misogünia tuvastamiseks', 'fi': 'Asiantuntijan huomautuksia sisältävä tietojoukko online-misogynian havaitsemiseksi', 'he': 'קבוצת נתונים מומחה שנוטטה לגילוי מיזוגיניה באינטרנט', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Strokovnjak z opombami nabor podatkov za odkrivanje spletne misogine', 'bo': 'དྲ་བ་སྐྱེལ་མེད་པའི་བཙལ་ཚོགས་སྐྱོང་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྙན་ཡོད་པ', 'jv': 'Ombudhakan Perintasi Dahaset kanggo Ketokakno Misogyèny online'}
{'en': 'Online misogyny is a pernicious social problem that risks making online platforms toxic and unwelcoming to women. We present a new hierarchical taxonomy for online misogyny, as well as an expert labelled dataset to enable automatic classification of misogynistic content. The dataset consists of 6567 labels for Reddit posts and comments. As previous research has found untrained crowdsourced annotators struggle with identifying misogyny, we hired and trained annotators and provided them with robust annotation guidelines. We report baseline classification performance on the binary classification task, achieving accuracy of 0.93 and F1 of 0.43. The codebook and datasets are made freely available for future researchers.', 'es': 'La misoginia en línea es un problema social pernicioso que corre el riesgo de hacer que las plataformas en línea sean tóxicas y poco acogedoras para las mujeres. Presentamos una nueva taxonomía jerárquica para la misoginia en línea, así como un conjunto de datos etiquetado por expertos para permitir la clasificación automática del contenido misógino. El conjunto de datos consta de 6567 etiquetas para publicaciones y comentarios de Reddit. Como investigaciones anteriores han descubierto que los anotadores no entrenados y colaborados tienen dificultades para identificar la misoginia, contratamos y capacitamos a anotadores y les proporcionamos pautas de anotación sólidas. Reportamos el rendimiento de la clasificación de referencia en la tarea de clasificación binaria, logrando una precisión de 0.93 y una F1 de 0.43. El libro de códigos y los conjuntos de datos están disponibles gratuitamente para futuros investigadores.', 'pt': 'A misoginia online é um problema social pernicioso que corre o risco de tornar as plataformas online tóxicas e pouco acolhedoras para as mulheres. Apresentamos uma nova taxonomia hierárquica para misoginia online, bem como um conjunto de dados rotulado por especialistas para permitir a classificação automática de conteúdo misógino. O conjunto de dados consiste em 6.567 rótulos para postagens e comentários do Reddit. Como pesquisas anteriores descobriram que anotadores de crowdsourcing não treinados lutam para identificar a misoginia, contratamos e treinamos anotadores e fornecemos a eles diretrizes de anotação robustas. Relatamos o desempenho de classificação de linha de base na tarefa de classificação binária, alcançando precisão de 0,93 e F1 de 0,43. O livro de códigos e conjuntos de dados são disponibilizados gratuitamente para futuros pesquisadores.', 'ar': 'تعد كراهية النساء عبر الإنترنت مشكلة اجتماعية خبيثة تخاطر بجعل منصات الإنترنت سامة وغير مرحب بها للنساء. نقدم تصنيفًا هرميًا جديدًا لكراهية النساء عبر الإنترنت ، بالإضافة إلى مجموعة بيانات ذات علامة خبيرة لتمكين التصنيف التلقائي للمحتوى الذي يكره النساء. تتكون مجموعة البيانات من 6567 ملصق لمشاركات وتعليقات Reddit. نظرًا لأن الأبحاث السابقة قد وجدت أن المعلقين غير المدربين من حشد المصادر يعانون من تحديد كراهية النساء ، فقد وظفنا المعلقين ودرّبناهم وزودناهم بإرشادات قوية للتعليقات التوضيحية. نقوم بالإبلاغ عن أداء التصنيف الأساسي في مهمة التصنيف الثنائي ، وتحقيق دقة 0.93 و F1 من 0.43. يتم توفير دفتر الرموز ومجموعات البيانات مجانًا للباحثين في المستقبل.', 'fr': "La misogynie en ligne est un problème social pernicieux qui risque de rendre les plateformes en ligne toxiques et peu accueillantes pour les femmes. Nous présentons une nouvelle taxonomie hiérarchique pour la misogynie en ligne, ainsi qu'un ensemble de données labellisé par des experts pour permettre la classification automatique du contenu misogyne. L'ensemble de données comprend 6567 étiquettes pour les publications et les commentaires Reddit. Comme des recherches précédentes ont révélé que les annotateurs crowdsourcés non formés ont du mal à identifier la misogynie, nous avons embauché et formé des annotateurs et leur avons fourni des directives d'annotation robustes. Nous rapportons les performances de classification de base pour la tâche de classification binaire, avec une précision de 0,93 et F1 de 0,43. Le livre de codes et les ensembles de données sont mis gratuitement à la disposition des futurs chercheurs.", 'zh': '在线厌女症者,世之害世也,有能使在线台之害女不受欢迎。 为在线厌女症供一新分类法,及一家标记数集,以成对厌女自类。 其数集由Reddit帖及论者6567署之。 前此研究,未经培训众包注者难知厌女症,故聘而培训之,为之强注指南。 告二元基线类,成 0.93 准确度 F1 之 0.43。 密码本及数据集免费给未来讲究人员。', 'hi': 'ऑनलाइन misogyny एक घातक सामाजिक समस्या है कि ऑनलाइन प्लेटफार्मों विषाक्त और महिलाओं के लिए unwelcoming बनाने का जोखिम है. हम ऑनलाइन misogyny के लिए एक नया पदानुक्रमित वर्गीकरण प्रस्तुत करते हैं, साथ ही साथ एक विशेषज्ञ लेबल डेटासेट को गलत सामग्री के स्वचालित वर्गीकरण को सक्षम करने के लिए। डेटासेट में Reddit पोस्ट और टिप्पणियों के लिए 6567 लेबल शामिल हैं। जैसा कि पिछले शोध में पाया गया है कि अप्रशिक्षित क्राउडसोर्स्ड एनोटेटर्स misogyny की पहचान करने के साथ संघर्ष करते हैं, हमने एनोटेटरों को काम पर रखा और प्रशिक्षित किया और उन्हें मजबूत एनोटेशन दिशानिर्देशों के साथ प्रदान किया। हम बाइनरी वर्गीकरण कार्य पर आधारभूत वर्गीकरण प्रदर्शन की रिपोर्ट करते हैं, 0.93 की सटीकता और 0.43 के F1 को प्राप्त करते हैं। कोडबुक और डेटासेट भविष्य के शोधकर्ताओं के लिए स्वतंत्र रूप से उपलब्ध कराए जाते हैं।', 'ja': 'オンラインミソジニーは有害な社会問題であり、オンラインプラットフォームを女性にとって有害で歓迎されないものにするリスクがあります。私たちは、オンラインミソジニーのための新しい階層分類と、ミソジニーのコンテンツの自動分類を可能にする専門家ラベル付きデータセットを提示します。データセットは、Redditの投稿とコメントのための6567ラベルで構成されています。以前の研究では、訓練されていないクラウドソーシングされた注釈者が、女性差別の特定に苦労していることが分かっているように、私たちは注釈者を雇用し、訓練し、堅牢な注釈ガイドラインを提供しました。バイナリ分類タスクのベースライン分類性能を報告し、0.93の精度と0.43のF 1を達成しました。コードブックとデータセットは、将来の研究者が自由に利用できるようになっています。', 'ga': "Is fadhb shóisialta dhocharach í an mhí-eolaíocht ar líne a bhfuil an baol ann go mbeidh ardáin ar líne tocsaineach agus gan fáilte roimh mhná. Cuirimid i láthair tacsanomaíocht ordlathach nua le haghaidh misogyny ar líne, chomh maith le tacar sonraí lipéadaithe saineolaithe chun a chumasú a aicmiú uathoibríoch ar ábhar míoginistic. Is éard atá sa tacar sonraí ná 6567 lipéad le haghaidh postálacha agus tuairimí Reddit. Ós rud é go bhfuarthas amach i dtaighde a rinneadh roimhe seo go bhfuil sé deacair ar nótaíóirí sluafhoinsithe neamh-oilte mí-eolaíocht a aithint, d'fhostaigh muid agus d'oilíomar nótaí agus chuireamar treoirlínte láidre anótála ar fáil dóibh. Tuairiscímid feidhmíocht aicmithe bonnlíne ar an tasc aicmithe dénártha, ag baint amach cruinneas 0.93 agus F1 de 0.43. Cuirtear an códleabhar agus na tacair shonraí ar fáil saor in aisce do thaighdeoirí amach anseo.", 'ru': 'Онлайн женоненавистничество является пагубной социальной проблемой, которая может сделать онлайн-платформы токсичными и нежелательными для женщин. Мы представляем новую иерархическую таксономию для онлайновой женоненавистнической деятельности, а также экспертный маркированный набор данных, позволяющий автоматически классифицировать женоненавистнический контент. Набор данных состоит из 6567 меток для сообщений и комментариев Reddit. Поскольку предыдущие исследования показали, что необученные краудсорсинговые аннотаторы борются с идентификацией женоненавистничества, мы наняли и обучили аннотаторов и предоставили им надежные рекомендации по аннотации. Мы сообщаем о выполнении базовой классификации по задаче двоичной классификации, достигая точности 0,93 и F1 0,43. Кодовая книга и наборы данных предоставляются будущим исследователям в свободном доступе.', 'el': 'Η διαδικτυακή μισογυνία είναι ένα ολέθριο κοινωνικό πρόβλημα που κινδυνεύει να κάνει τις διαδικτυακές πλατφόρμες τοξικές και ανεπιθύμητες για τις γυναίκες. Παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα ιεραρχική ταξινομία για την διαδικτυακή μισογυνία, καθώς και ένα σύνολο δεδομένων με ετικέτα εμπειρογνωμόνων για την αυτόματη ταξινόμηση του μισογυνιστικού περιεχομένου. Το σύνολο δεδομένων αποτελείται από ετικέτες 6567 για δημοσιεύσεις και σχόλια στο Reddit. Καθώς η προηγούμενη έρευνα έχει διαπιστώσει ότι οι μη εκπαιδευμένοι σχολιαστές δυσκολεύονται να εντοπίσουν μισογυνία, προσλάβαμε και εκπαιδεύσαμε σχολιαστές και τους παρέχουμε ισχυρές οδηγίες σχολιασμού. Αναφέρουμε την απόδοση ταξινόμησης βάσης στην εργασία δυαδικής ταξινόμησης, επιτυγχάνοντας ακρίβεια 0.93 και F1 0.43. Το βιβλίο κωδικών και τα σύνολα δεδομένων διατίθενται ελεύθερα για μελλοντικούς ερευνητές.', 'hu': 'Az online nőgyűlölet veszélyes társadalmi probléma, amely kockázattal jár, hogy az online platformokat mérgezővé és nem szívesen teszi a nőket. Bemutatunk egy új hierarchikus taxonómiát az online nőgyűlésre, valamint egy szakértői címkével ellátott adatkészletet, amely lehetővé teszi a nőgyűlés automatikus osztályozását. Az adatkészlet 6567 címkét tartalmaz Reddit bejegyzésekhez és megjegyzésekhez. Mivel korábbi kutatások megállapították, hogy a nem képzett közösségi forrásokkal rendelkező kommentátorok küzdenek a nőgyűlölet azonosításával, ezért felvettük és képeztük a kommentátorokat, és szilárd jegyzetelési irányelveket adtunk nekik. Jelentjük a bináris osztályozási feladat alapvető osztályozási teljesítményét, elérve a pontosságot 0,93 és F1 0,43. A kódkönyv és adatkészletek a jövőbeli kutatók számára szabadon hozzáférhetők.', 'ka': 'Online misogyny is a pernicious social problem that risks making online platforms toxic and unwelcoming to women. ჩვენ ახალი ჰიერაქტიკური რაქონიომის შესახებ online misogyny და ექსპერტიკური მონაცემების კონფიგურაციას ჩართვალოთ misogynistic content-ის ავტომატური კლასიფიკაცია. მონაცემების კომპორტი შექმნა 6567 etiket რედიტის პოსტის და კომენტრების. როგორც წინა შესწავლობა აღმოჩნდა, რომ არაფერი მუშაობელი ანტოტორიები განვიცნობით მუშაობით, ჩვენ დავყენეთ და განვიცნობით ანტოტორიები და ჩვენ ისინი უფრო ძალიან ანტორიაციის ჩვენ გვეუბნება ბინარი კლასიფიკაციის კლასიფიკაციის გამოსახულება, რომელიც 0.93 და 0.43 მინუს F1. კოდენტიკური და მონაცემების კოდენტიკური კოდენტიკური თავისუფალურად ხელხილებია მომავალეთ მსწავლობისთვის.', 'it': "La misoginia online è un problema sociale pernicioso che rischia di rendere le piattaforme online tossiche e sgradite alle donne. Presentiamo una nuova tassonomia gerarchica per la misoginia online, così come un set di dati etichettato da esperti per consentire la classificazione automatica dei contenuti misogini. Il set di dati è composto da 6567 etichette per post e commenti Reddit. Poiché ricerche precedenti hanno scoperto che gli annotatori non addestrati con crowdsourcing faticano a identificare la misoginia, abbiamo assunto e addestrato gli annotatori e fornito loro solide linee guida per l'annotazione. Riportiamo le prestazioni di classificazione di base sull'attività di classificazione binaria, raggiungendo una precisione di 0,93 e F1 di 0,43. Il codebook e i dataset sono messi gratuitamente a disposizione dei futuri ricercatori.", 'mk': 'Интернет мизогинијата е штетен социјален проблем кој ризикува да ги направи онлајн платформите токсични и непријатни за жените. Презентираме нова хиерархична таксономија за онлајн мизогинија, како и експерт означен со податоци за овозможување автоматска класификација на мизогинистичката содржина. Податоците се состојат од 6567 етикети за Reddit постови и коментари. Како што претходното истражување откри дека непроучени публички анотатори се борат со идентификување на мизогија, најмивме и трениравме анотатори и им обезбедивме силни насоки за анотација. Ние известуваме за основната класификација на бинарната класификација задача, постигнувајќи точност од 0,93 и F1 од 0,43. Кодот и датотеките се слободно поставени за идните истражувачи.', 'lt': 'Online netinkamumas yra kenksminga socialinproblema, dėl kurios kyla pavojus, kad internetinės platformos taps toksiškos ir nepatenkinamos moterims. Mes pristatome naują hierarchinę internetinės misoginijos taksonomiją ir ekspertų pažymėtą duomenų rinkinį, kad būtų galima automatiškai klasifikuoti misogininį turinį. Duomenų rinkinį sudaro 6567 Reddit postų ir pastabų etiketės. Kadangi ankstesniuose tyrimuose buvo nustatyta, kad apmokyti visuomeniniai anotatoriai kovoja su klaidingumu, mes įdarbinome ir apmokėme anotatorius ir jiems pateikėme patikimas anotacijos gaires. Mes pranešame apie pradinį klasifikavimo rezultatą dviejų klasifikavimo uždavinių atžvilgiu, siekdami tikslumo 0,93 ir F1 0,43. Kodų knyga ir duomenų rinkiniai bus laisvai prieinami būsimiems mokslininkams.', 'kk': 'Онлайн масогия - онлайн платформалардың әйелдерге қатынасыз және қатынасыз болуы мүмкін емес әлемдік мәселе. Біз онлайн бусогиясы үшін жаңа иерархикалық таксономия және мәліметтердің деректер жиыны автоматты түрде бусогинистикалық мазмұнын шектеу үшін белгіленген эксперттерді таңдаймыз. Деректер жиында Reddit жіберу және түсініктемелер үшін 6567 жарлық жарлығы бар. Алдыңғы зерттеулердің көпшілік көпшілікті жаңалықтарды табуға көмектеседі. Біз жаңалықтарды табуға көмектеседі. Біз жаңалықтарды және оқылған жаңалықтарды және оларды құпты жа Біз бинарлық классификациялау тапсырмасының негізгі классификациялау әрекетін есептеп береміз, 0,93 және 0,43 деген F1 деген дұрыстығын жеткіземіз. Кодекстік кітапша мен деректер жинақтары болашақ зерттеушілер үшін жеткілікті болады.', 'ms': 'Misogyni online adalah masalah sosial yang berbahaya yang membuat platform online beracun dan tidak diterima kepada wanita. Kami memperkenalkan taksonomi hierarkik baru untuk misogyni online, serta set data labeled ahli untuk membolehkan kelasukan automatik kandungan misogynistic. Set data terdiri dari 6567 label untuk pos dan komen Reddit. As previous research has found untrained crowdsourced annotators struggle with identifying misogyny, we hired and trained annotators and provided them with robust annotation guidelines.  Kami laporkan prestasi klasifikasi dasar pada tugas klasifikasi binari, mencapai ketepatan 0.93 dan F1 0.43. Buku kod dan set data dibenarkan secara bebas untuk penyelidik masa depan.', 'ml': 'ഓണ്\u200dലൈനിലെ അസാമൂഹ്യ പ്രശ്നമാണ് അത് സ്ത്രീകള്\u200dക്ക് വിഷമമില്ലാത്ത ഒരു സാമൂഹിക പ്രശ്നമാണ്. ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d അസാധാരണയ്ക്കുവേണ്ടി ഒരു പുതിയ ഹിയറാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d ടാക്സോനോമിയെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. ഒരു വിശേഷിപ്പുകാര്\u200d ലേബെല്\u200dഡ് ചെയ റെഡിഡിറ്റ് പോസ്റ്റുകള്\u200dക്കും അഭിപ്രായങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുമുള്ള ഡാറ്റാസറ്റില്\u200d 6567 ലേബിളുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ട്. മുമ്പുള്ള പരിശോധന കണ്ടെത്തിയപ്പോള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d തിന്മയെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് കൊണ്ട് മുഴുവന്\u200d കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d പ്രശ്നമില്ലാത്ത ആളുകള്\u200d പോര ബൈനറി ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ജോലിയില്\u200d ബേസ്ലൈന്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d പ്രകടനം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നു. 0. 93, 0. 43 ല്\u200d  ഭാവിയുടെ പരിശീലിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് സ്വതന്ത്ര്യമായി കോഡ്ബുക്കും ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളും ലഭ്യമാക്ക', 'mt': 'Il-misoġinja onlajn hija problem a soċjali perniċjuża li tirriskja li l-pjattaformi onlajn isiru tossiċi u ma jilqgħux lin-nisa. Aħna nippreżentaw tassonomija ġerarkika ġdida għall-misoġinja onlajn, kif ukoll sett ta’ dejta ttikkettat minn esperti li jippermetti klassifikazzjoni awtomatika tal-kontenut misoġenistiku. Is-sett tad-dejta jikkonsisti minn 6567 tikketta għall-postijiet u l-kummenti Reddit. Peress li r-riċerka preċedenti sabet li annotaturi crowdsourced mhux imħarrġa qed jiġġieldu biex jidentifikaw il-ħażin, aħna impjegajna u mħarrġa annotaturi u pprovdilna linji gwida robusti għall-annotazzjoni. Aħna nirrappurtaw il-prestazzjoni tal-klassifikazzjoni fil-linja bażi dwar il-kompitu ta’ klassifikazzjoni binarja, li jiksbu preċiżjoni ta’ 0.93 u F1 ta’ 0.43. Il-kodiċi u s-settijiet tad-dejta huma disponibbli liberament għar-riċerkaturi futuri.', 'no': 'Online misogyny er eit vanskeleg sosialproblem som riskerer å gjera internetplattformar toksisk og unwelkom til kvinner. Vi presenterer eit nytt hierarkisk taxonomi for online misogyni, og ein ekspert med datasett for å slå på automatisk klassifisering av misogynisk innhald. Datasettet inneheld 6567 etikettar for Reddit- post og kommentarar. Etter at førre forskning har funne uansegrenserte crowdsourced annotators strømmer med å identifisera feogynisk, har vi løpt og trenga annotatorar og gi dei med kraftige oppmerkingslinjer. Vi rapporterer baseline klassifikasjonsfunksjon på den binære klassifikasjonen, og når det er nøyaktig 0,93 og F1 av 0,43. Kodeboken og datasettet er fritt tilgjengeleg for framtidige forskere.', 'mn': 'Онлайн буруу буруу нь эмэгтэйчүүдэд хохиромжтой болон сэтгэл санагдахгүй нийгмийн асуудал юм. Бид онлайн буруу зөрчилдөөний шинэ архитекийн татекономийг, мөн өгөгдлийн хэлбэртэй мэргэжилтэн автоматжуулан буруу ойлголтыг автоматжуулах боломжтой болгодог. Өгөгдлийн сангууд нь Редит захидал болон сэтгэлгээний 6567 тэмдэглэгддэг. Өмнөх судалгаанаас олон хүмүүсийн сэтгэл хөдлөл байгуулагч буруу байдлыг тодорхойлж чаддаг учраас бид сэтгэл хөдлөлгүүдийг ажиллаж, дасгал хөдлөлгүүдийг ажиллаж, тэднийг хүчтэй сэтгэл хөдл Бид хоёр дахь хэлбэрийн даалгаврын үндсэн хэлбэрийн үр дүнг 0.93 болон F1 нь 0.43-ын зөв байдлыг хүртэл тайлбарлаж байна. Кодекс ном, өгөгдлийн сангууд ирээдүйн судлаачдын хувьд чөлөөтэй байдаг.', 'pl': 'Mizoginia online jest szkodliwym problemem społecznym, który ryzykuje, że platformy internetowe będą toksyczne i niemile widziane dla kobiet. Przedstawiamy nową hierarchiczną taksonomię mizoginii online, a także zestaw danych oznaczonych ekspertem umożliwiający automatyczną klasyfikację mizoginistycznych treści. Zestaw danych składa się z etykiet 6567 dla postów i komentarzy Reddit. Ponieważ wcześniejsze badania wykazały, że nieprzeszkoleni adnotatorzy crowdsourcingowi borykają się z identyfikacją mizoginii, zatrudniliśmy i przeszkolowaliśmy adnotatorów i dostarczyliśmy im solidne wytyczne dotyczące adnotacji. Raportujemy wyniki klasyfikacji bazowej w zadaniu klasyfikacji binarnej, osiągając dokładność 0.93 i F1 od 0.43. Kodeks i zbiory danych są udostępniane swobodnie dla przyszłych badaczy.', 'ro': 'Misoginia online este o problemă socială pernicioasă care riscă să facă platformele online toxice și nedorite pentru femei. Vă prezentăm o nouă taxonomie ierarhică pentru misoginia online, precum și un set de date etichetat de expert pentru a permite clasificarea automată a conținutului misogin. Setul de date constă din 6567 etichete pentru postările și comentariile Reddit. Deoarece cercetările anterioare au descoperit că adnotatorii netranșați din crowdsourcing se luptă cu identificarea misoginiei, am angajat și instruit adnotatorii și le-am oferit orientări solide de adnotare. Raportăm performanța de clasificare de bază pentru sarcina de clasificare binară, obținând acuratețe de 0,93 și F1 de 0,43. Cartea de coduri și seturile de date sunt puse la dispoziția viitorilor cercetători.', 'sr': 'Online misogynija je loš društveni problem koji rizikuje da se online platforme toksiène i nezadovoljavaju ženama. Predstavljamo novu hijerarhičku taksonomiju za online misoginiju, kao i ekspertu označenog seta podataka kako bi omogućili automatsku klasifikaciju misoginističkog sadržaja. Podaci sastoje od 6567 etiketa za Reddit postove i komentare. Kao što je prethodno istraživanje pronašlo bezkišne popularne annotatore bore se sa identifikacijom misognije, unajmili smo i obučene annotatore i pružili im robne upute za annotaciju. Prijavljujemo početnu klasifikaciju o zadatku binarne klasifikacije, postižeći tačnost od 0,93 i F1 od 0,43. Kodne knjige i podatke su slobodno dostupne za buduće istraživače.', 'so': 'Faaheynta internetka waa dhibaatooyin bulshada ah oo khatar ku leh oo khatar ka dhiga jardiinada internetka oo khatar ah oo dumarka u imaanaya khatar iyo khatar la’aan. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa cashuur cusub oo ku saabsan shabakadda misognimo, iyo sawir aqoonta la qoray, si ay u soo bandhigaan iskuulka waxyaabaha caadiga ah. Rugta macluumaadku waxay ka kooban yihiin 6567 alaabta warqadaha Reddit iyo commentarka. Sidii baaritaankii hore loo ogaaday inay la dagaalamaan dadka dhibaatada badan oo aan roolayn, waxaynu kiraysannay, waannu tababarinnay, waxaana siinay hogaamiyayaal ku saabsan dhibaatada. We report baseline classification performance on the binary classification task, achieving accuracy of 0.93 and F1 of 0.43.  Bogagga codsiga iyo macluumaadka waxaa lacag la’aan loogu fidiyaa baaritaanka mustaqbalka ah.', 'sv': 'Missogini online är ett skadligt socialt problem som riskerar att göra onlineplattformar giftiga och ovälkomnande för kvinnor. Vi presenterar en ny hierarkisk taxonomi för misogyni online, samt en expertmärkt datauppsättning för att möjliggöra automatisk klassificering av misogyniskt innehåll. Datauppsättningen består av 6567 etiketter för Reddits inlägg och kommentarer. Eftersom tidigare forskning har visat att otränade crowdsourcerade kommentatorer kämpar med att identifiera kvinnogyni anlitade och utbildade kommentatorer och försett dem med robusta riktlinjer för anteckningar. Vi rapporterar baseline klassificering prestanda för binär klassificering uppgift, uppnår noggrannhet på 0,93 och F1 på 0,43. Kodboken och datauppsättningarna görs fritt tillgängliga för framtida forskare.', 'ta': 'இணைய பாதிப்பு பெண்களுக்கு புரியாத சமூக பிரச்சனை நாங்கள் ஒரு புதிய புதிய புதிய புதிய தேவையை கொண்டு வருகிறோம், மற்றும் ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட தகவல் அமைப்பு, தானாகவே தோற்றம் உள்ளடக்கத்தை வகைப் Reddit அஞ்சல் மற்றும் குறிப்புகளுக்கு தரவு அமைப்பு 6567 சிட்டைகள் உள்ளது. As previous research has found untrained crowdsourced annotators struggle with identifying misogyny, we hired and trained annotators and provided them with robust annotation guidelines.  நாம் அடிப்படைக்கோட்டில் வகுப்பு செயல்பாட்டை இரு வகுப்பு பணியில் அறிவிக்கிறோம், 0. 93 மற்றும் F1 of 0. 43. குறியீடு புத்தகம் மற்றும் தகவல் அமைப்புகள் எதிர்கால ஆராய்ச்சியாளர்', 'si': 'ඇන්ලයින් වැරැද්දක් තමයි සාමාජික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්නේ අන්ලයින් ප්ලෝටිෆෝම්ටර් වලට විශේෂ ස අපි අන්තර්ජාත්මක වැරදිය සඳහා අළුත් අභ්\u200dයාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට පෙන්වන් ඩේටාසෙට් එක්ක රෙඩිඩිට් පොස්ට් සහ කොටස් සඳහා ලේබල් 6567 තියෙනවා. මුලින් පරීක්ෂණය හොයාගත්තා වගේම අවස්ථානයක් නැති කණ්ඩායම් කණ්ඩායම් කණ්ඩායම් කරනවා කියලා, අපි අවස්ථානයක් අරගත්තා  අපි අධ්\u200dයාත්මක විශේෂණ ක්\u200dරියාවට පරීක්ෂණ ක්\u200dරියාවට වාර්තා කරනවා, 0.93 වල F1 වල 0.43 වලින් 0.93 වලින්. කෝඩ් පොත සහ දත්ත සැට් අනාගතයේ පරීක්ෂකයන්ට නිදහස් වෙන්න පුළුවන්.', 'ur': 'آنلاین کی غلطی ایک خطرناک سوسیال مسئلہ ہے جو آنلاین پلٹروم کو سمجھ اور عورتوں کے ساتھ ناخوشی کرنے کا خطرناک ہے. ہم نے اولانین غلطی کے لئے ایک نئی حیراتریکی تاکسونومی کو پیش کیا ہے، اور ایک متخصص نے لابل کیا ڈاٹ سٹ کو غلطی منصوبات کی آٹوٹی کلاسیک کرنے کے لئے۔ ڈاٹ سٹ میں 6567 لیبل ہے ریڈیٹ پوسٹ اور ٹوکیٹ کے لئے۔ جس طرح پہلے کی تحقیقات دیکھی ہے کہ بغیر سرمایہ کرنے والے بغیر سرمایہ کرنے والے جہاد کرتے ہیں، ہم نے اذیت کرنے والوں کو استعمال کیا اور انہیں سخت اذیت دینے والی ہدایت دیں۔ ہم بنیس لین کلاسیفون کی عملکرد کے بارے میں راپورت کرتے ہیں، 0.93 اور 0.43 کی صحیح پہنچ رہے ہیں. کوڈ بوک اور ڈیٹ سٹ مستقبل تحقیقات کرنے والوں کے لئے آزاد طور پر موجود ہیں.', 'uz': "Onlaynda misogik, shaxsiy ijodkorlik muammolari, bu online platformlarni to ʻxtatish va ayollarga kelmaydi. Biz Online misogynisi uchun yangi hierarchik taxonomni hozir qilamiz, va faqat taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar tarkibini avtomatik misogynistik tarkibini tayyorlash mumkin. Name Oldingi o'rganishni o'rganishni o'rganishga o'rganishda o'zgarishni o'rganishga harakat qilayotganimiz mumkin, biz o'zgarishlarni kiritdik va o'rganishni o'rganishni o'rganamiz va ularga qo'llanmalar yordamchilarini Biz birinchi darajalashtirish vazifasi asosiy darajasining bajarishini xabar qilamiz, 0.93 va 0.43ning 0.43dan F1 tasdiqlash imkoniyatini bajaramiz. Kodlash kitobi va maʼlumotlar tarkibi kelajakdagi taʼminlovchilar uchun buyruq mavjud.", 'vi': 'Sự dâm đãng trực tuyến là một vấn đề xã hội không lành mạnh có nguy cơ làm cho các platform online trở nên độc hại và không được chào đón. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một loại phân loại phổ biến mới cho người phụ nữ online, cũng như một bộ dữ liệu có nhãn chuyên gia để có thể phân loại tính phụ nữ tự động. Bộ dữ liệu gồm nhãn 65657 cho các bài viết của Reddit và bình luận. Như các nghiên cứu trước đã tìm ra giải thích chưa được huấn luyện để xác định sự ghét phụ nữ, chúng tôi đã thuê và huấn luyện các nhà sử dụng và cung cấp cho họ một bản ghi chú đầy đủ. Chúng tôi báo cáo hiệu ứng phân hạng cơ bản về nhiệm vụ phân loại nhị phân, đạt độ chính xác 0.93 và F1 of 0.43. Mật danh và các bộ dữ liệu được cung cấp tự do cho các nghiên cứu tương lai.', 'bg': 'Онлайн женомразата е вреден социален проблем, който рискува да направи онлайн платформите токсични и нежелани за жените. Представяме нова йерархична таксономия за онлайн женомраза, както и експертно обозначен набор от данни, за да позволим автоматична класификация на женомраза съдържание. Наборът от данни се състои от 6567 етикета за публикации и коментари в Редит. Тъй като предишни проучвания установиха, че нетренираните анотатори с crowdsourcing се борят с идентифицирането на женомразата, ние наехме и обучихме анотатори и им предоставихме солидни указания за анотация. Отчитаме резултатите от базовата класификация на задачата за двоична класификация, като постигаме точност от 0,93 и Ф1 от 0,43. Книгата с кодове и наборите от данни са свободно достъпни за бъдещи изследователи.', 'hr': 'Online misogynija je zlobni društveni problem koji rizikuje da se online platforme toksične i nezdravljaju ženama. Predstavljamo novu hijerarhičku taksonomiju za online misoginiju, kao i stručnjaku označenog seta podataka kako bi omogućili automatsku klasifikaciju misoginističkog sadržaja. Podaci sastoje od 6567 etiketa za Reddit postove i komentare. Kao što je prethodno istraživanje pronašlo neprihvaćene publikovane annotatore bore se s identifikacijom nesporazuma, unajmili smo i obučene annotatore i pružili im jake upute za annotaciju. Prijavljujemo početne klasifikacije o zadatku za binarnu klasifikaciju, ostvarivši točnost 0,93 i F1 od 0,43. Kodne knjige i podatke su slobodno dostupne za buduće istraživače.', 'nl': 'Online misogynie is een schadelijk sociaal probleem dat online platforms giftig en onprettig maakt voor vrouwen. We presenteren een nieuwe hiërarchische taxonomie voor online misogynie, evenals een door experts gelabelde dataset om automatische classificatie van misogynistische inhoud mogelijk te maken. De dataset bestaat uit 6567 labels voor Reddit posts en comments. Omdat eerder onderzoek heeft aangetoond dat ongetrainde crowdsourcing annotators moeite hebben met het identificeren van misogynie, hebben we annotators ingehuurd en getraind en hen voorzien van robuuste annotatierichtlijnen. We rapporteren baseline classificatieprestaties op de binaire classificatietaak, het bereiken van nauwkeurigheid van 0.93 en F1 van 0.43. Het codeboek en de datasets worden vrij beschikbaar gesteld voor toekomstige onderzoekers.', 'da': 'Online misogini er et skadeligt socialt problem, der risikerer at gøre online platforme giftige og uvelkomne for kvinder. Vi præsenterer en ny hierarkisk taksonomi for online misogini samt et ekspertmærket datasæt, der muliggør automatisk klassificering af misoginistisk indhold. Datasættet består af 6567 etiketter til Reddit indlæg og kommentarer. Da tidligere forskning har fundet, at utrænede crowdsourcerede kommentatorer kæmper med at identificere misogini, hyrede og uddannede kommentatorer og gav dem robuste retningslinjer for annotering. Vi rapporterer baseline klassifikations ydeevne på den binære klassifikationsopgave, hvilket opnår en nøjagtighed på 0,93 og F1 på 0,43. Kodebogen og datasættet stilles frit til rådighed for fremtidige forskere.', 'de': 'Online-Frauenfeindlichkeit ist ein schädliches soziales Problem, das die Gefahr birgt, Online-Plattformen giftig und für Frauen unwillkommen zu machen. Wir präsentieren eine neue hierarchische Taxonomie für Online-Frauenfeindlichkeit sowie einen von Experten gekennzeichneten Datensatz, um eine automatische Klassifizierung von Frauenfeindlichkeit zu ermöglichen. Der Datensatz besteht aus 6567 Labels für Reddit Beiträge und Kommentare. Da frühere Untersuchungen herausgefunden haben, dass ungeübte Crowdsourcing-Annotatoren Schwierigkeiten haben, Frauenfeindlichkeit zu erkennen, haben wir Annotatoren eingestellt und geschult und ihnen robuste Annotationsrichtlinien zur Verfügung gestellt. Wir berichten über die Leistung der Baseline-Klassifizierung für die binäre Klassifikationsaufgabe und erreichen Genauigkeit von 0.93 und F1 von 0.43. Das Codebuch und die Datensätze werden für zukünftige Forscher frei zugänglich gemacht.', 'id': 'Online misogyny is a pernicious social problem that risks making online platforms toxic and unwelcoming to women.  Kami mempersembahkan taksonomi hierarkis baru untuk misogini online, serta sebuah set data yang disebut ahli untuk memungkinkan klasifikasi otomatis dari isi misoginis. The dataset consists of 6567 labels for Reddit posts and comments.  Seperti penelitian sebelumnya telah menemukan annotator yang tidak terlatih yang berasal dari masyarakat berjuang untuk mengidentifikasi kesalahan, kami menyewa dan melatih annotator dan memberikan mereka petunjuk anotasi yang kuat. Kami melaporkan prestasi klasifikasi dasar pada tugas klasifikasi binari, mencapai akurasi 0,93 dan F1 0,43. Buku kode dan set data dibuat secara bebas tersedia untuk peneliti masa depan.', 'ko': '인터넷 염녀증은 해로운 사회문제로 인터넷 플랫폼이 여성에게 해롭고 환영을 받지 못할 수도 있다.우리는 새로운 온라인 염녀증 층별 분류법과 전문가가 표시한 데이터 집합을 제시하여 염녀증 내용의 자동 분류를 실현하였다.이 데이터 세트는 6567개의 Reddit 게시물 및 설명 태그로 구성됩니다.앞서 연구한 바와 같이 교육을 받지 않은 하청 주석은 여성을 혐오하는 것을 식별하기 어려워 주석을 고용하고 교육했으며 강력한 주석 지침을 제공했다.우리는 이원 분류 임무의 기선 분류 성능을 보고했는데 정밀도는 0.93이고 F1은 0.43이다.코드북과 데이터 집합은 미래의 연구원들에게 무료로 제공된다.', 'fa': 'ناراحتی آنلاین یک مشکل اجتماعی خطرناک است که خطرناک ساختن پلاکارهای آنلاین سمی و ناراحتی برای زنان است. ما تاکسونومی جدیدی را برای اشتباهی آنلاین، و یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای متخصص را برای فعال\u200cسازی خودکار از محتوای ناشناسی نشان می\u200cدهیم. مجموعه داده\u200cها از نقاشی 6567 برای پست\u200cهای Reddit و توضیح\u200cها وجود دارند. همانطور که تحقیقات قبلی پیدا کرده\u200cاند که آگاهی\u200cکننده\u200cهای گروهی غیر محسوب شده\u200cاند که با شناسایی ناگوار مبارزه می\u200cکنند، ما آگاهی\u200cکننده\u200cها را استخدام کردیم و آموزش دادیم و آنها را با هدایت\u200cهای سخت آگاهی دادیم. ما گزارش برنامه\u200cهای مختصات پایین\u200cخط را بر وظیفه\u200cی مختصات دویینی گزارش می\u200cدهیم، با رسیدن دقیق 0.93 و F1 از 0.43. کتاب رمز و مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها برای محققان آینده آزاد در دسترس قرار داده می\u200cشوند.', 'sw': 'Ushafanuzi wa mtandaoni ni tatizo zuri la kijamii ambalo linahatarisha kufanya majukwaa ya mtandaoni yanayotokana na kutokuwepo kwa wanawake. Tunatoa utamaduni mpya wa kisasa kwa ajili ya kutokuelewana na utambulisho wa mtandaoni, pamoja na seti ya taarifa za wataalam zilizotajwa ili kuwezesha kutafsiri maudhui yasiyofahamika. Taarifa hiyo ina alama 6567 kwa ajili ya makala za Reddit na maoni. Kama utafiti ulivyopita ulivyogundua wapiganaji wanaosababishwa na mashindano ya watu wasio na mafunzo, tuliajiri na kuwafundisha wachochezi na kuwapa maelekezo ya uchochezi. Tunatoa taarifa ya utendaji wa usambazaji wa msingi kuhusu kazi ya usambazaji binafsi, kupata uhakika wa 0.93 na F1 wa 0.43. Kitabu na seti za taarifa zinapatikana kwa uhuru kwa watafiti wa baadaye.', 'af': "Online ële misogynie is 'n verkeerde sosiale probleem wat risiko maak online platforme toksik en onwelkom vir vroue. Ons stel 'n nuwe hierarkies taksonomie voor aanlyn misogynie, en 'n eksperteer wat etiketeerde datastel is om outomatiese klasifikasie van misogynistiese inhoud te aktiveer. Die datastel bestaan van 6567 etiket vir Reddit pos en kommentaar. Soos vorige ondersoek gevind het onreënde skakeloorspronklike annotators struikel met die identifiseer van misogynie, het ons opgelei en opgelei annotators en hulle verskaf met kragtige annotasie-gidsels. Ons rapporteer basisline klasifikasie-prestasie op die binêre klasifikasie-taak, die presisie van 0.93 en F1 van 0.43 tot bereik. Die kodeboek en datastelle word vry beskikbaar vir toekomstige ondersoekers gemaak.", 'tr': 'Çaltynda ýalňyşyk bolup, online platformlary a ýallara toksiýa we welinmegi täsirleýän sosialy meselelerdir. Biz internetde ýalňyşlyk üçin täze bir iýerarhiýa taksiloniň we munuň etildikleri maglumaty awtomatik terjime etmek üçin etildik. Maglumat setirinde 6567 etiketlerdir. Öňki araştyrmalar ýagdaýdaky kalam-täsirli hasaplançylar ýalňyşlygyny tanap bilen çykyp barýardyklaryny tapyp, biz nusgalançylary hakyna tutdyk we olara ýigrenç duýdurma düzgünlerini berdik. Biz 2.93 we 0.43-nyň F1 derejesini ýetýäris. Kod kitaby we veri setirleri gelejekde gözatçylar üçin özgür ýazmak üçin hazırlanýar.', 'sq': 'Misogjinia online është një problem social i dëmshëm që rrezikon që platformet online të bëhen toksike dhe të pashëndetshme për gratë. Ne paraqesim një taksonomi të re hierarkike për misogjininë online si dhe një grup të dhënash me etiketë eksperte për të mundësuar klasifikimin automatik të përmbajtjes misogjinike. The dataset consists of 6567 labels for Reddit posts and comments.  Ndërsa kërkimet e mëparshme kanë gjetur që anotatorët e papërmjetësuar të burimeve publike luftojnë me identifikimin e gabimeve, ne punësuam dhe trajnuam anotatorët dhe u dhamë atyre udhëzime të forta për anotacion. Ne raportojmë rezultatet e klasifikimit bazë në detyrën e klasifikimit binar, duke arritur saktësinë 0.93 dhe F1 0.43. Kodi dhe grupet e të dhënave janë bërë lirisht të disponueshme për kërkuesit e ardhshëm.', 'am': 'የኢንተርኔት ስህተት ሴቶችን ለመቀላቀል የሚያስቸግረውን የኢንተርኔት የጦማር ማህበራዊ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ የኢንተርኔት ስህተት ላይ አዲስ የኤሬርርክስቲክ ስህተት እና የአፍሪካዊ ዳታተር እና የስህተት ግንኙነትን ማቀናቀል እናስችላለን፡፡ የዳታ ሳጥን ለReddit ጽሑፎች እና አስተያየቶች 6567 ምልክቶች ነው፡፡ የቀድሞው ምርመራ ሳይዘረጋ የብሔራዊ ጉዳይ ተቃዋሚዎች የስህተት ግጭት ሲያገኙት፣ እና ተማሪዎችን ቀጠርን እና አስተማርናቸው እና የጥብቅ ጉዳይ መግለጫ ሰጥተናል፡፡ 2.93 እና 0.43 የ. የኮድቡክ እና ዳታ-ሰርተኞቹ ለቀኑ ተማሪዎች ነጻ እንዲገኙ ናቸው።', 'az': 'Online misogyniya, online platformların qadınlara zehirli və təhlükəsiz olmasını riskləndirən sosial problemidir. Biz online misogyniya üçün yeni hiyerarşik taxonomiya və misogynistik məlumatının otomatik klasifikasiyasını qabilleştirmək üçün etiket edilmiş bir ekspertə göstəririk. Reddit məlumatları və şəkillər üçün 6567 etiketi var. Əvvəlki araştırmaların təhsil edilmədiyi halda, qövmünün təhsil edilməsini təsdiqləməsi ilə mübahisə edənlər tapıldığı kimi, biz təhsil edənləri istifadə etdik və onlara möhkəm təhsil göstəricisi bəxş etdik. İkili klasifikasiya görevi barəsində, 0.93 və 0.43 tərəflərinin doğruluğunu başa çatdırmaq üçün sinyal klasifikasiya performansını xəbər veririk. Kod kitabı və veri qurğuları gələcək araştırmacılara özgür olaraq faydalanır.', 'bn': 'অনলাইনে ভুল ধারণা হচ্ছে একটি বিশাল সামাজিক সমস্যা, যা অনলাইন প্ল্যাটফর্ম ব্যস্ত এবং নারীদের কাছে অনলাইনে বিদায়িত্ আমরা অনলাইন ভিজ্ঞানের জন্য একটি নতুন হিরেরার্কিল ক্যাক্সোনাম উপস্থাপন করেছি, আর একটি বিশেষজ্ঞ ডাটাসেট, যাতে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ভুল বিষয়বস রেডিডিট পোস্ট এবং মন্তব্যের জন্য ডাটাসেটের মধ্যে 6567 লেবেল রয়েছে। যেহেতু পূর্ববর্তী গবেষণা খুঁজে পেয়েছে বৃষ্টিপূর্ণ গবেষণার ক্ষেত্রে বিরক্তিকরা ভুল ধারণা চিহ্নিত করার জন্য সংগ্রাম করেছে, আমরা ভা আমরা বাইনারি শ্রেণীবিভাগ কাজের উপর বেসেলাইনের শ্রেণীকরণের প্রতিবেদন প্রদান করি, ০. ৯৩ এবং ০. 43 এর ফেসবুকের সঠিকভাবে পৌঁছা ভবিষ্যতের গবেষকদের জন্য কোডেবুক এবং ডাটাসেটগুলো স্বাধীনতা পাওয়া যাচ্ছে।', 'hy': 'Օնլայն խաբեությունը վտանգավոր սոցիալական խնդիր է, որը վտանգավորում է, որ առցանց պլատֆորմերը թունավոր են դարձնում և կանանց համար անընդունելի: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր հիերարխիկական դասակարգ առցանց խաբեության համար, ինչպես նաև մասնագետ, որոնք պիտակ են տալիս տվյալների համակարգը, որպեսզի հնարավոր լինի խաբեխիկական պարունակության ավտոմատիկ դասակարգման: Տվյալների համակարգը կազմված է Reddit-ի գրքերի և մեկնաբանությունների 6567 պիտակներից: Քանի որ նախորդ հետազոտությունները բացահայտեցին, որ անվարժեցված ժողովրդի ծառայություն ունեցող նոտոտորատորները պայքարում են սխալ հայտնաբերման հետ, մենք վարձեցինք և սովորեցրեցինք նոտորատորներ և նրանց տվեցինք ուժեղ նոտորացիայի Մենք տեղեկացնում ենք հիմնական դասակարգման արդյունքը երկարային դասակարգման խնդրի վրա, հասնելով 0.93 և F1-ի 0.43 ճշգրտությունը: Կոդագրքերը և տվյալների համակարգերը ազատ հասանելի են ապագա հետազոտողների համար:', 'ca': "La misogínia en línia és un problem a social perniciós que corre el risc de fer que les plataformes en línia siguin tòxices i no aconsegueixin la benvinguda a les dones. Presentam una nova taxonomia jeràrquica per a la misogínia en línia, com també un conjunt de dades etiquetat per a poder classificar automàticament el contingut misogínic. El conjunt de dades consisteix en 6567 etiquetes per publicacions i comentaris Reddit. Com la recerca anterior ha descobert que anotators no entrenats de multitud lluiten per identificar la misogínia, vam contractar i entrenar anotators i els vam proporcionar directrices robustes d'anotació. Informem el rendiment de classificació basal sobre la tasca de classificació binaria, aconseguint una precisió de 0,93 i F1 de 0,43. El llibre de codis i els conjunts de dades estan lliurament disponibles per a futurs investigadors.", 'bs': 'Online misogynija je opasan socijalni problem koji rizikuje da se online platforme toksične i nepoštovaju ženama. Predstavljamo novu hijerarhičku taksonomiju za online misogniju, kao i stručnjaku označenog seta podataka kako bi omogućili automatsku klasifikaciju misoginističkog sadržaja. Podaci se sastoje od 6567 etiketa za Reddit postove i komentare. Kao što je prethodno istraživanje pronašlo bezkišne popularne annotatore bore se s identifikacijom nesreće, unajmili smo i obučene annotatore i pružili im robne upute za annotaciju. Prijavljujemo početnu klasifikaciju o zadatku binarne klasifikacije, ostvarimo preciznost 0,93 i F1 od 0,43. Kodne knjige i podatke su slobodno dostupne za buduće istraživače.', 'cs': 'Online misogynie je škodlivý sociální problém, který riskuje, že online platformy budou toxické a nevítané pro ženy. Představujeme novou hierarchickou taxonomii pro online misogynii, stejně jako odborník označený datovou sadu umožňující automatickou klasifikaci misogynistického obsahu. Datová sada se skládá z 6567 štítků pro Reddit příspěvky a komentáře. Jelikož předchozí výzkum zjistil, že netrénovaní crowdsourcingoví anotátoři bojují s identifikací misogynie, najali jsme a vyškolili anotátory a poskytli jim robustní pokyny pro anotaci. Zaznamenáváme základní klasifikační výkon na úlohu binární klasifikace, dosahující přesnosti 0,93 a F1 0,43. Šifrovací kniha a datové sady jsou volně k dispozici budoucím výzkumným pracovníkům.', 'et': 'Online naisvihkamine on kahjulik sotsiaalne probleem, mis võib muuta internetiplatvormid toksiliseks ja ebasoovitavaks naistele. Tutvustame uut hierarhilist taksonoomiat online misogünia jaoks ning ekspertide märgistatud andmekogumit, mis võimaldab misogünistliku sisu automaatset klassifitseerimist. Andmekogum koosneb 6567 sildist Redditi postitustele ja kommentaaridele. Kuna varasemad uuringud on näidanud, et koolitamata ühisallikatega annotatoritel on raskusi naisvihkamise tuvastamisega, palkasime ja koolitasime annotatoreid ning andsime neile tugevad annotatsioonijuhised. Esitame baasil klassifitseerimise tulemuslikkuse binaarse klassifitseerimise ülesandel, saavutades täpsuse 0,93 ja F1 0,43. Koodiraamat ja andmekogumid on tulevastele teadlastele vabalt kättesaadavad.', 'fi': 'Verkkomisogynia on tuhoisa sosiaalinen ongelma, joka saattaa tehdä verkkoalustoista myrkyllisiä ja epämiellyttäviä naisille. Esittelemme uuden hierarkkisen taksonomian nettimisogynialle sekä asiantuntijamerkinnän, joka mahdollistaa misogynistisen sisällön automaattisen luokittelun. Aineisto koostuu 6567 tunnisteesta Reddit-postauksille ja kommenteille. Koska aiemmat tutkimukset ovat osoittaneet, että kouluttamattomat joukkolähteellä varustetut annotaatorit kamppailevat naisvihauden tunnistamisessa, palkkasimme ja koulutimme annotaattoreita ja annoimme heille selkeät annotaatioohjeet. Raportoimme perusluokituksen suorituskyvyn binääriluokituksessa saavuttaen tarkkuuden 0,93 ja F1 0,43. Koodikirja ja aineistot ovat vapaasti tulevien tutkijoiden käytettävissä.', 'ha': "Kayyari na Online yana da wata mataimaki mai kyãwo ga jamii wanda ke hatar ta samun platform masu zartar da kuma bã ya halatta ga mãtã. Tuna halatar da wani taɓani na hierrrchical na misogi tare da sami na taƙaita taɓallun da aka rubũta, dõmin ya fara siffarwa farat ɗaya na maɓallin misogistic. @ info: whatsthis Kama da research na gabani ya gane na da ba'a yi wa marãyi na mutane ba, sai muka kirãyi kuma muka sanar da su shiryarwa na zartar da. Tuna Rari'ar da aikin classified na ƙarƙashin layin da aka sami aikin fassarar biyu, kuma za'a gaskata tsarin 0.93 da F1 na 0.43. An samar da littafin kodi da database buɗaɗe wa watan kewayi.", 'he': 'מיזוגיניה באינטרנט היא בעיה חברתית נזקקת שמסתכנת להפוך פלטפורמות באינטרנט רעילות ולא ברוכה הבאה לנשים. אנחנו מציגים טקסונומיה היררכית חדשה למוזוגיניה באינטרנט, כמו גם קבוצת מידע מומחית שמתוויפת כדי לאפשר סיווג אוטומטי של תוכן מיזוגיניסטי. The dataset consists of 6567 labels for Reddit posts and comments.  כפי שמחקר קודם מצא ציונים לא מאומנים ממקורות קהל מתאבקים בזיהוי שגיונים, שכרנו ומאמנים ציונים וספקנו להם כיווני ציונים חזקים. אנו מדווחים על ביצועים בסיסיים על משימת הסיפור הבינרי, להשיג מדויקה של 0.93 ו-F1 של 0.43. The codebook and datasets are made freely available for future researchers.', 'sk': 'Spletna sovražnost žensk je škodljiv družbeni problem, zaradi katerega obstaja tveganje, da bodo spletne platforme strupene in nedobrodošle ženskam. Predstavljamo novo hierarhično taksonomijo za spletno sovražnost žensk in strokovno označen nabor podatkov, ki omogoča samodejno klasifikacijo žensk sovražnosti. Zbirka podatkov je sestavljena iz 6567 oznak za Reddit objave in komentarje. Ker so prejšnje raziskave pokazale, da se neizurjeni množični označevalci težko prepoznavajo sovražnosti žensk, smo najeli in usposobili označevalce in jim zagotovili robustne smernice za označevanje. Poročamo osnovno uspešnost klasifikacije pri opravilu binarne klasifikacije, pri čemer dosežemo natančnost 0,93 in F1 0,43. Kodni knjig in nabori podatkov so prosto dostopni bodočim raziskovalcem.', 'jv': 'online misogny kuwi perusahaan sing paling-perusahaan sing nganggep kuwi nggawe sistem online karo nggawe barang dumadhi iki luwih apik lan nganggep kuwi nganggep bantayan. Gemenah online Sampeyan dataset nduwe angan oleh, liman kanggo ditambah karo Komentar Awak dhéwé éntuk akeh perusahaan kanggo ngilanggar populer sing nggawe gerakan luwih dumateng, awak dhéwé mau nggawe lan ijol-ijolan sing beraksi lan ijol-ijolan sing berarti ilegal gawe lan ijol-ijolan sing berarti. Genjer Kaya ngulok karo dataset kuwi ngewasi kanggo sabanjuré ceritang kapen.', 'bo': 'དྲ་ཐོག་ནས་བློ་གཏད་འགྱུར་བ་ནི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས། དྲ་རྒྱ་གླིང་གི་གླིང་ཐོག་དང་བྱ་མེད We present a new hierarchical taxonomy for online misogyny, as well as an expert labelled dataset to enable automatic classification of misogynistic content. སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་རྒྱབ་ལྗོངས་ཀྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་6567 ཡིན། སྔོན་གྱི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་མ་ཡོད་པའི་དུས་གཏོང་འབྲེལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བསྡད་མེད་པའི་ཡིག་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་བ་ཡོད་པའ ང་ཚོས་ཟུར ཨང་ཀི་དེབ་དང་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དག་གི་མ་འོངས་བའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་སྟངས་རང་དབང་སྦྱར་བ'}
{'en': 'WikiMatrix : Mining 135 M Parallel Sentences in 1620 Language Pairs from Wikipedia', 'ar': 'WikiMatrix: تعدين 135 مليون جمل متوازية في 1620 أزواج لغوية من ويكيبيديا', 'es': 'WikiMatrix: Extracción de 135 millones de oraciones paralelas en 1620 pares de idiomas de Wikipedia', 'ja': 'WikiMatrix ： Wikipediaからの1620の言語ペアでの135 Mの並列文のマイニング', 'zh': 'WikiMatrix:掘维基百科中1620语对中1.35亿个平行句', 'fr': 'WikiMatrix\xa0: Exploration de 135 millions de phrases parallèles dans 1620 paires de langues depuis Wikipedia', 'pt': 'WikiMatrix: Mineração de 135 milhões de frases paralelas em 1620 pares de idiomas da Wikipedia', 'hi': 'WikiMatrix: विकिपीडिया से 1620 भाषा जोड़े में खनन 135M समानांतर वाक्य', 'ga': 'WikiMatrix: Mianadóireacht 135M Pianbhreitheanna Comhthreomhara i 1620 Péirí Teanga ón Vicipéid', 'ru': 'WikiMatrix: Mining 135M Parallel Sentences in 1620 Language Pairs from Wikipedia', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Wikimátrix: 135M párhuzamos mondatok bányászata 1620 nyelvpárban a Wikipédiából', 'kk': 'WikiMatrix: mining 135M Parallel sentences in 1620 Language Pairs from Wikipedia', 'it': 'WikiMatrix: Estrazione di 135M frasi parallele in 1620 coppie linguistiche da Wikipedia', 'el': 'WikiMatrix: Εξόρυξη 135παράλληλων προτάσεων σε 1620 γλωσσικά ζεύγη από τη Βικιπαίδεια', 'lt': 'WikiMatrix: Mining 135M Parallel Sentences in 1620 Language Pairs from Wikipedia', 'mk': 'WikiMatrix: минирање паралелни реченици 135M во 1620 јазички парови од Wikipedia', 'ms': 'WikiMatrix: Menyembah Hukuman Paralel 135M dalam 1620 Pasangan Bahasa dari Wikipedia', 'mt': 'WikiMatrix: Mining 135M Parallel Sentences in 1620 Language Pairs from Wikipedia', 'ml': 'വികിമാറ്റിക്സ്: വിക്കിപിഡിയയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള 1620 ഭാഷ പേയിര്\u200dസുകളില്\u200d 135M പാരാളല്\u200d ശിക്ഷകള്\u200d കുറവാണ്', 'pl': 'WikiMatrix: Wydobywanie zdań równoległych 135M w parach językowych 1620 z Wikipedii', 'mn': 'WikiMatrix: Mining 135M Parallel sentences in 1620 Language Pairs from Wikipedia', 'si': 'Name', 'sr': 'WikiMatrix: Miniranje 135M Paralelne kazne 1620 jezičke pare iz Wikipedia', 'so': 'WikiMatrix: Mining 135M Parallel Sentences in 1620 Luqada Pairs from Wikipedia', 'no': 'WikiMatrix: Mining 135M Parallel Uttrykk i 1620 Språk Pair frå Wikipedia', 'ro': 'WikiMatrix: Mining 135M de sentințe paralele în 1620 perechi de limbi din Wikipedia', 'ur': 'WikiMatrix: مینینگ 135M پارالئل سنٹنس 1620 زبان کے جوڑے ویکیپیڈیا سے', 'sv': 'WikiMatrix: Utvinning av 135M parallella meningar i 1620 språkpar från Wikipedia', 'ta': 'விகிமாட்ரிக்ஸ்: விகிபிடியாவில் இருந்து 1620 மொழியில் 135M அளபுரு வாக்குகளை குறைந்தது', 'vi': 'WikiLMa Trận: Bản khai thác 135M KCharselect unicode block name', 'uz': 'WikiMatrix: WikipediaName', 'hr': 'WikiMatrix: Miniranje 135M Paralelne kazne u 1620 jezičke pare iz Wikipedia', 'bg': 'Извличане на 135 млн паралелни изречения в 1620 езикови двойки от Уикипедия', 'da': 'WikiMatrix: Udvinding af 135M parallelle sætninger i 1620 sprogpar fra Wikipedia, den frie encyklopædi', 'nl': 'WikiMatrix: Mijnen van 135M parallelle zinnen in 1620 Taalparen uit Wikipedia', 'fa': 'WikiMatrix: Mining 135M Parallel sentences in 1620 Language Pairs from Wikipedia', 'ko': 'WikiMatrix: 위키백과에서 1620개의 언어 쌍 중 1.35억 개의 평행문장을 발굴', 'sw': 'WikiMatrix: Kupungua Makosa ya Makazi 135M katika Lugha 1620 kutoka Wikipedia', 'id': 'WikiMatrix: Menyembah Hukuman Paralel 135M dalam 1620 Pasangan Bahasa dari Wikipedia', 'de': 'WikiMatrix: Mining von 135M parallelen Sätzen in 1620 Sprachpaaren aus Wikipedia', 'sq': 'WikiMatrix: Mining 135M Parallel Sentences in 1620 Language Pairs from Wikipedia', 'tr': 'WikiMatrix: Mazmunlar 135M Parallel sözler 1620 Dil Pairs from Wikipedia', 'az': 'WikiMatrix: Mining 135M Parallel sentence in 1620 Language Pairs from Wikipedia', 'am': 'WikiMatrix: Mining 135M Parallel Sentences in 1620 language Pairs from Wikipedia', 'bn': 'WikiMatrix: Mining 135M Parallel Sentences in 1620 Language Pairs from Wikipedia', 'hy': 'Wikipedia', 'af': 'WikiMatrix: Mining 135M Parallel Sentences in 1620 Taal Pairs van Wikipedia', 'bs': 'WikiMatrix: Miniranje 135M Paralelne kazne 1620 jezičkih pare iz Wikipedia', 'cs': 'WikiMatrix: Dolování paralelních vět 135M v jazykových párech 1620 z Wikipedie', 'et': 'WikiMatrix: 135M paralleelse lause kaevandamine 1620 keelepaaris – Vikipeedia', 'fi': 'WikiMatrix: 135M rinnakkaislauseen louhinta 1620 kieliparia Wikipediasta', 'ca': 'WikiMatrix: Mining 135M Parallel Sentences in 1620 Language Pairs from Wikipedia', 'sk': 'WikiMatrix: Izkopavanje 135M vzporednih stavkov v 1620 jezikovnih parov iz Wikipedije', 'ha': 'WikiMatrix: Mining 135M Parallel Percents in 1620 Lugha Pairs from Wikimedia', 'bo': 'WikiMatrix: Mining 135M Parallel Sentences in 1620 Language Pairs from Wikipedia', 'he': 'WikiMatrix: מכרות 135M גזרים Parallel ב 1620 שפות זוגות בוויקיפדיה', 'jv': 'Ungroup'}
{'en': 'We present an approach based on multilingual sentence embeddings to automatically extract parallel sentences from the content of Wikipedia articles in 96 languages, including several dialects or low-resource languages. We do not limit the extraction process to alignments with English, but we systematically consider all possible language pairs. In total, we are able to extract 135 M parallel sentences for 16720 different language pairs, out of which only 34 M are aligned with English. This corpus is freely available. To get an indication on the quality of the extracted bitexts, we train neural MT baseline systems on the mined data only for 1886 languages pairs, and evaluate them on the TED corpus, achieving strong BLEU scores for many language pairs. The WikiMatrix bitexts seem to be particularly interesting to train MT systems between distant languages without the need to pivot through English.', 'ar': 'نقدم نهجًا يعتمد على تضمين الجمل متعددة اللغات لاستخراج جمل متوازية تلقائيًا من محتوى مقالات ويكيبيديا في 96 لغة ، بما في ذلك العديد من اللهجات أو اللغات منخفضة الموارد. نحن لا نحصر عملية الاستخراج في التوافق مع اللغة الإنجليزية ، لكننا نأخذ في الاعتبار بشكل منهجي جميع الأزواج اللغوية الممكنة. في المجموع ، نحن قادرون على استخراج 135 مليون جملة متوازية لـ 16720 زوجًا لغويًا مختلفًا ، منها 34 مليونًا فقط تتماشى مع اللغة الإنجليزية. هذه المجموعة متاحة مجانًا. للحصول على إشارة إلى جودة bitexts المستخرجة ، نقوم بتدريب أنظمة الخط الأساسي لـ MT العصبية على البيانات الملغومة فقط لـ 1886 زوجًا من اللغات ، وتقييمها على مجموعة TED ، وتحقيق درجات BLEU قوية للعديد من أزواج اللغات. يبدو أن نصوص WikiMatrix bit مثيرة للاهتمام بشكل خاص لتدريب أنظمة الترجمة الآلية بين اللغات البعيدة دون الحاجة إلى التمحور من خلال اللغة الإنجليزية.', 'es': 'Presentamos un enfoque basado en la incorporación de oraciones multilingües para extraer automáticamente oraciones paralelas del contenido de los artículos de Wikipedia en 96 idiomas, incluidos varios dialectos o idiomas de bajos recursos. No limitamos el proceso de extracción a alineaciones con el inglés, sino que consideramos sistemáticamente todas las combinaciones de idiomas posibles. En total, podemos extraer 135 millones de oraciones paralelas para 16720 pares de idiomas diferentes, de los cuales solo 34 millones están alineados con el inglés. Este corpus está disponible gratuitamente. Para obtener una indicación de la calidad de los bitextos extraídos, entrenamos sistemas de referencia de MT neuronales en los datos extraídos solo para 1886 pares de idiomas, y los evaluamos en el corpus TED, logrando puntuaciones BLEU sólidas para muchos pares de idiomas. Los bitextos de WikiMatrix parecen ser particularmente interesantes para entrenar sistemas de traducción automática entre idiomas distantes sin necesidad de pasar por el inglés.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma abordagem baseada em embeddings de frases multilíngues para extrair automaticamente frases paralelas do conteúdo de artigos da Wikipedia em 96 idiomas, incluindo vários dialetos ou idiomas de poucos recursos. Não limitamos o processo de extração a alinhamentos com o inglês, mas consideramos sistematicamente todos os pares de idiomas possíveis. No total, conseguimos extrair 135 milhões de frases paralelas para 16.720 pares de idiomas diferentes, dos quais apenas 34 milhões estão alinhados com o inglês. Este corpus está disponível gratuitamente. Para obter uma indicação sobre a qualidade dos bitextos extraídos, treinamos sistemas de linha de base MT neural nos dados extraídos apenas para 1886 pares de idiomas e os avaliamos no corpus TED, alcançando pontuações BLEU fortes para muitos pares de idiomas. Os bitextos do WikiMatrix parecem ser particularmente interessantes para treinar sistemas de TA entre idiomas distantes sem a necessidade de pivotar pelo inglês.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une approche basée sur l'intégration de phrases multilingues pour extraire automatiquement des phrases parallèles du contenu des articles Wikipédia dans 96 langues, y compris plusieurs dialectes ou des langues à ressources limitées. Nous ne limitons pas le processus d'extraction aux alignements avec l'anglais, mais nous prenons systématiquement en compte toutes les paires de langues possibles. Au total, nous sommes en mesure d'extraire 135 millions de phrases parallèles pour 16720 paires de langues différentes, dont seulement 34 millions sont alignées avec l'anglais. Ce corpus est disponible gratuitement. Pour obtenir une indication sur la qualité des bitextes extraits, nous entraînons des systèmes de base de MT neuronale sur les données extraites uniquement pour 1886 paires de langues, et nous les évaluons sur le corpus TED, obtenant ainsi de bons scores BLEU pour de nombreuses paires de langues. Les bitextes WikiMatrix semblent particulièrement intéressants pour entraîner les systèmes de TA entre des langues distantes sans qu'il soit nécessaire de basculer en anglais.", 'zh': '多言句嵌之法,可以96言者维基百科自取平行句,兼数方低资源语。 不限于英语之一致性,系统地虑其可也。 赞曰∶16720异言1.35亿个平行句,惟3400万个与英语齐。 此语料库是免费供也。 为得提双文本质之指,但于1886种语言对掘数上训练神经MT基线系统,并于TED语料库上质之,以强BLEU分数。 WikiMatrix双文本似特有趣,可以远习机器翻译统,而无因英语透视。', 'hi': 'हम बहुभाषी वाक्य एम्बेडिंग के आधार पर एक दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं ताकि 96 भाषाओं में विकिपीडिया लेखों की सामग्री से स्वचालित रूप से समानांतर वाक्यों को निकाला जा सके, जिसमें कई बोलियां या कम संसाधन वाली भाषाएं शामिल हैं। हम निष्कर्षण प्रक्रिया को अंग्रेजी के साथ संरेखण तक सीमित नहीं करते हैं, लेकिन हम व्यवस्थित रूप से सभी संभावित भाषा जोड़े पर विचार करते हैं। कुल मिलाकर, हम 16720 विभिन्न भाषा जोड़ों के लिए 135M समानांतर वाक्य निकालने में सक्षम हैं, जिनमें से केवल 34M अंग्रेजी के साथ संरेखित हैं। यह कोष स्वतंत्र रूप से उपलब्ध है। निकाले गए bitexts की गुणवत्ता पर एक संकेत प्राप्त करने के लिए, हम केवल 1886 भाषाओं के जोड़े के लिए खनन किए गए डेटा पर तंत्रिका एमटी बेसलाइन सिस्टम को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं, और टेड कॉर्पस पर उनका मूल्यांकन करते हैं, कई भाषा जोड़े के लिए मजबूत BLEU स्कोर प्राप्त करते हैं। WikiMatrix bitexts अंग्रेजी के माध्यम से धुरी की आवश्यकता के बिना दूर की भाषाओं के बीच एमटी सिस्टम को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए विशेष रूप से दिलचस्प प्रतीत होते हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем подход, основанный на многоязычных вложениях предложений, чтобы автоматически извлекать параллельные предложения из содержимого статей Википедии на 96 языках, включая несколько диалектов или малоресурсных языков. Мы не ограничиваем процесс извлечения выравниваниями с английским языком, но систематически рассматриваем все возможные языковые пары. В общей сложности мы можем извлечь 135 млн параллельных предложений для 16720 разных языковых пар, из которых только 34 МЛН совпадают с английским языком. Этот корпус находится в свободном доступе. Чтобы получить представление о качестве извлеченных битекстов, мы обучаем нейронные базовые системы MT на добываемых данных только для 1886 языковых пар и оцениваем их на корпусе TED, достигая сильных баллов BLEU для многих языковых пар. Битовые тексты WikiMatrix представляются особенно интересными для обучения систем MT между удаленными языками без необходимости поворота через английский язык.', 'ja': '私たちは、いくつかの方言または低資源言語を含む96の言語のウィキペディア記事の内容から並行する文章を自動的に抽出するための多言語の文章埋め込みに基づいたアプローチを提示します。抽出プロセスは英語との整列に限定されませんが、可能なすべての言語ペアを体系的に検討しています。合計で、16720の異なる言語ペアに対して135 Mの並列文を抽出することができますが、そのうち英語と整列しているのは34 mのみです。このコーパスは自由に利用できます。抽出されたビットテキストの品質を示すために、1886言語ペアの採掘データのみに基づいてニューラルMTベースラインシステムをトレーニングし、TEDコーパスで評価し、多くの言語ペアで強力なBLEUスコアを達成します。WikiMatrixビットテキストは、英語を通じてピボットする必要なく、遠隔言語間のMTシステムをトレーニングすることが特に興味深いようです。', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair cur chuige atá bunaithe ar leabú abairtí ilteangacha chun abairtí comhthreomhara a bhaint go huathoibríoch as ábhar ailt Vicipéide i 96 teanga, lena n-áirítear roinnt canúintí nó teangacha íseal-acmhainne. Ní chuirimid teorainn leis an bpróiseas asbhainte chuig ailínithe leis an mBéarla, ach déanaimid machnamh córasach ar gach péirí teanga féideartha. Ar an iomlán, táimid in ann 135M abairtí comhthreomhara a bhaint as 16720 péirí teangacha éagsúla, agus níl ach 34M acu ailínithe leis an mBéarla. Tá an corpas seo ar fáil saor in aisce. Le léiriú a fháil ar cháilíocht na mbíthéacs a bhaintear, déanaimid traenáil ar chórais bonnlíne néaracha MT ar na sonraí aimsithe do 1886 péirí teangacha amháin, agus déanaimid measúnú orthu ar chorpas TED, ag baint amach scóir láidre BLEU do go leor péirí teangacha. Is cosúil go bhfuil na bittéacsanna WikiMatrix thar a bheith suimiúil córais MT a oiliúint idir teangacha i bhfad i gcéin gan gá le pivotáil trí Bhéarla.', 'hu': 'Egy többnyelvű mondatbeágyazáson alapuló megközelítést mutatunk be, amely a Wikipédia cikkeinek tartalmából 96 nyelven automatikusan kivonja a párhuzamos mondatokat, beleértve több dialektust vagy alacsony erőforrású nyelvet. A kivonási folyamatot nem korlátozzuk az angol nyelvhez való igazításra, de szisztematikusan figyelembe vesszük az összes lehetséges nyelvpárt. Összesen 135M párhuzamos mondatot tudunk kivonni 16720 különböző nyelvpárhoz, amelyből csak 34M igazodik az angolhoz. Ez a korpusz szabadon hozzáférhető. A kivont bitextek minőségére vonatkozó indikáció érdekében csak 1886 nyelvpárra vonatkozó bányászati adatokra vonatkozó neurális MT alapvető rendszereket képzünk, majd értékeljük őket a TED korpuszon, így sok nyelvpár esetében erős BLEU pontszámot érünk el. A Wikimátrix bitextjei különösen érdekesek a távoli nyelvek közötti MT rendszerek oktatására anélkül, hogy angolul kellene forgatni.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια προσέγγιση βασισμένη σε πολυγλωσσικές ενσωματώσεις προτάσεων για την αυτόματη εξαγωγή παράλληλων προτάσεων από το περιεχόμενο άρθρων της Βικιπαίδειας σε 96 γλώσσες, συμπεριλαμβανομένων διαφόρων διαλέκτων ή γλωσσών χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας. Δεν περιορίζουμε τη διαδικασία εξαγωγής σε ευθυγράμμιση με τα αγγλικά, αλλά εξετάζουμε συστηματικά όλα τα πιθανά γλωσσικά ζεύγη. Συνολικά, είμαστε σε θέση να εξάγουμε 135παράλληλες προτάσεις για 16720 διαφορετικά γλωσσικά ζεύγη, από τα οποία μόνο 34Μ ευθυγραμμίζονται με τα Αγγλικά. Αυτό το σώμα είναι ελεύθερα διαθέσιμο. Για να πάρουμε μια ένδειξη για την ποιότητα των εξαγόμενων bitexts, εκπαιδεύουμε νευρωνικά συστήματα βάσης ΜΤ στα εξορυγμένα δεδομένα μόνο για ζεύγη γλωσσών 1886 και τα αξιολογούμε στο σώμα επιτυγχάνοντας ισχυρές βαθμολογίες για πολλά γλωσσικά ζεύγη. Τα bitexts του WikiMatrix φαίνεται να είναι ιδιαίτερα ενδιαφέροντα για την εκπαίδευση συστημάτων ΜΤ μεταξύ μακρινών γλωσσών χωρίς την ανάγκη να περιστρέφεται μέσω της αγγλικής γλώσσας.', 'it': "Presentiamo un approccio basato sull'incorporazione di frasi multilingue per estrarre automaticamente frasi parallele dal contenuto degli articoli di Wikipedia in 96 lingue, inclusi diversi dialetti o lingue a basso contenuto. Non limitiamo il processo di estrazione agli allineamenti con l'inglese, ma consideriamo sistematicamente tutte le possibili coppie linguistiche. In totale, siamo in grado di estrarre 135M frasi parallele per 16720 diverse coppie linguistiche, di cui solo 34M sono allineati con l'inglese. Questo corpus è liberamente disponibile. Per ottenere un'indicazione sulla qualità dei bit estratti, addestriamo i sistemi di base MT neurali sui dati estratti solo per 1886 coppie di lingue, e li valutiamo sul corpus TED, ottenendo punteggi BLEU forti per molte coppie linguistiche. I bitext WikiMatrix sembrano essere particolarmente interessanti per addestrare sistemi MT tra lingue lontane senza la necessità di ruotare attraverso l'inglese.", 'ka': 'ჩვენ ვიყენებთ მრავალენგური სიტყვების შესაბამისი პროგრამეტს, რომელიც ავტომატურად პარალელი სიტყვების გამოყენება ვიკიპედიაში 96 ენების შესაბამისგან, რამდენიმე დიალექტი ან ჩვენ ვერ დავდგენებთ ექსტრექციის პროცესი ანგლისური დაწყვეტილებისთვის, მაგრამ ჩვენ სისტემატიკურად ყველა შესაძლებელი ენის ზოგების დაწყ ჩვენ შეგვიძლია 16720 განსხვავებული ენის ზოგებისთვის 135M პარალელური სიტყვების გამოყენება, რომლებიდან მხოლოდ 34M ინგლისური გამოყენება. რჲჱთ კჲპოსჟ ვ ბლადჲეაპნჲ. გამოყენებული ბიტექსტის კალგატის შესახებ, ჩვენ ნეიროლური MT ფესტლინის სისტემების შესახებ მინეირებული მონაცემების შესახებ მხოლოდ 1886 ენების ზოგებისთვის და მათ TED კორპუსში გავუმუშაოთ, ძალიან ბლ ვიკიმატრიქსის ბიკსტი იქნება განსაკუთრებული ინტერესტიურია MT სისტემის გასწავლობა განსხვავებული ენების შორის განსხვავებაში, რომელიც ინგლისურად უნდა გაუბ', 'lt': 'Mes siūlome metodą, pagrįstą daugiakalbiais sakiniais, kad automatiškai ištrauktų lygiagrečius sakinius iš Wikipedia straipsnių turinio 96 kalbomis, įskaitant keletą dialektų arba mažai išteklių turinčias kalbas. Mes neapsiribojame ekstrahavimo procesu tik suderinimais su anglų kalba, bet sistemingai svarstome visas galimas kalbų poras. In total, we are able to extract 135M parallel sentences for 16720 different language pairs, out of which only 34M are aligned with English.  Šis korpusas laisvai prieinamas. Kad gautume įrodymą apie ekstrahuotų bitkstų kokybę, mes mokome nervines MT bazines sistemas kasybos duomenimis tik 1886 kalbų poroms, ir vertiname juos TED korpusuje, siekdami stiprių BLEU rezultatų daugeliui kalbų poroms. Atrodo, kad WikiMatrix bitexts yra ypač įdomūs MT sistemų mokymui tarp tolimų kalbų nereikalaujant apsisukti anglų kalba.', 'kk': 'Біз көп тіл сөздеріне негізделген көптеген сөздерді 96 тілде Википедия мақалаларының мазмұнынан автоматты түрде тарқату үшін, бірнеше диалекттер не төмен ресурстар тілдеріне негізделген тәртібін та Біз тарқату процесін ағылшын тіліне теңдеу үшін шектелмейміз, бірақ жүйелік түрде барлық тіл екеуін қалаймыз. Жалпы, біз 16720 тілінің параллелі сөздерін аламыз. Олардан тек 34M ағылшын тіліне тұрады. Бұл корпус еркін қол жеткізеді. Сырып шығарылған биктесттердің сапасы туралы белгілеу үшін, біз тек 1886 тілдердің екі тілдерінде нейрондық MT негізгі жүйелерін оқып, TED корпусында оқу үшін, көп тілдер үшін күшті BLEU нәтижелерін жеткіземіз. Викиматрикстың биктесі ағылшын тілдерінің арасындағы MT жүйелерін оқыту үшін өте қызықты сияқты.', 'mk': 'Презентираме пристап базиран на мултијазични реченици за автоматски извлекување паралелни реченици од содржината на статиите од Википедија на 96 јазици, вклучувајќи неколку дијалекти или јазици со ниски ресурси. Не го ограничуваме процесот на извлекување на уреди со англиски, но систематски ги разгледуваме сите можни јазички парови. Вкупно, можеме да извлечеме 135 милиони паралелни реченици за 16720 различни јазички парови, од кои само 34 милиони се прилагодени со англиски. Овој корпус е слободно достапен. За да добиеме индикација за квалитетот на извадените гризнати тексти, ги обучуваме нервните системи на MT основни податоци на минираните податоци само за 1886 јазички парови, и ги оценуваме на TED корпусот, достигнувајќи силни БЛЕ оценки за многу јазички парови. Текстите на WikiMatrix се чини дека се особено интересни за обука на MT системите помеѓу далечните јазици без потреба да се сврти низ англиски јазик.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan berdasarkan pembenaman kalimat berbilang bahasa untuk secara automatik mengekstrak kalimat selari dari kandungan artikel Wikipedia dalam 96 bahasa, termasuk beberapa dialekt atau bahasa sumber rendah. Kami tidak membatasi proses ekstraksi kepada penyesuaian dengan bahasa Inggeris, tetapi kami secara sistematik mempertimbangkan semua pasangan bahasa yang mungkin. Secara keseluruhan, kita boleh mengekstrak kalimat selari 135M untuk 16720 pasangan bahasa yang berbeza, dari mana hanya 34M disesuaikan dengan bahasa Inggeris. Korpus ini tersedia secara bebas. Untuk mendapatkan indikasi tentang kualiti teks gigit ekstrak, kita melatih sistem dasar MT saraf pada data tambang hanya untuk pasangan bahasa 1886, dan menilai mereka pada korpus TED, mencapai skor BLEU kuat untuk banyak pasangan bahasa. Teks gigitan WikiMatrix nampaknya sangat menarik untuk melatih sistem MT antara bahasa jauh tanpa perlukan pivot melalui bahasa Inggeris.', 'mn': 'Бид олон хэлний өгүүлбэрүүдийг автоматжуулахын тулд 96 хэл дээр Википедийн өгүүлбэрээс параллел өгүүлбэрүүдийг автоматжуулахын тулд олон хэлний хэлбэрүүдийг тайлбарлаж байна. Бид англи хэлний хоорондоо гаргах үйл явцыг хязгаарлагдахгүй, гэхдээ бид систематик бүх боломжтой хэлний хоорондоо бодож байна. Нийтээр бид 16720 оны хэл хооронд 135M параллель өгүүлбэрийг гаргаж чадна. Иймээс 34M нь англи хэл дээр байдаг. Энэ корпус чөлөөтэй байдаг. Бид цэвэрлэгдсэн бикстийн сайн талаар илэрхийлж, 1886 оны хэл хоорондоо цэвэрлэгдсэн мэдээллийн суурь мэдээллийн системийг суралцаж, TED корпус дээр үнэлж, олон хэл хоорондоо хүчирхэг BLEU оноо гаргаж байна. WikiMatrix bitexts нь маш сонирхолтой мэт харагдаж байгаа юм. Англи хэлний хувьд орон зай хэлний хоорондын MT системийг сургах хэрэггүй.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy podejście oparte na wielojęzycznych osadzeniach zdań do automatycznego wyodrębniania zdań równoległych z treści artykułów Wikipedii w 96 językach, w tym kilku dialektach lub językach niskich zasobów. Nie ograniczamy procesu ekstrakcji do dopasowania do języka angielskiego, ale systematycznie rozważamy wszystkie możliwe pary językowe. W sumie jesteśmy w stanie wyodrębnić zdania równoległe 135M dla 16720 różnych par językowych, z których tylko 34M są dostosowane do angielskiego. Korpus ten jest wolno dostępny. Aby uzyskać wskazówki na jakość ekstraktowanych bitekstów, trenujemy neuronowe systemy bazowe MT na wydobytych danych tylko dla par językowych 1886 i oceniamy je na korpusie TED, osiągając silne wyniki BLEU dla wielu par językowych. Biteksty WikiMatrix wydają się być szczególnie interesujące do trenowania systemów MT między odległymi językami bez konieczności obracania się po angielsku.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein tilnærming basert på fleirspråk setningar for å automatisk pakka ut parallelle setningar frå innhaldet av Wikipedia-artiklar i 96 språk, inkludert fleire dialektar eller låg ressursspråk. Vi grenserer ikkje utpakkingsprosessen til innstillingar med engelsk, men vi systematisk betrar alle moglege språkopar. I tillegg kan vi pakke ut 135M parallelle setningar for 16720 ulike språkopar, der berre 34M er retta med engelsk. Denne korpusen er fritt tilgjengeleg. For å få eit indikasjon på kvaliteten av dei ekstraherte bitextane, treng vi neurale MT-baseline-systemet på minerte data berre for 1886 språkparar, og evaluerer dei på TED-korpusen, og når det gjer sterke BLEU-poeng for mange språkparar. Det ser ut til at WikiMatrix-bitxtane er spesielt interessante for å trenga MT-systemet mellom distant språk utan at det må pivotera gjennom engelsk.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm o abordare bazată pe încorporarea frazelor multilingve pentru extragerea automată a frazelor paralele din conținutul articolelor Wikipedia în 96 de limbi, inclusiv mai multe dialecte sau limbi cu resurse reduse. Nu limităm procesul de extragere la alinierea cu limba engleză, dar luăm în considerare sistematic toate perechile de limbi posibile. În total, putem extrage 135M de propoziții paralele pentru 16720 de perechi de limbi diferite, dintre care doar 34M sunt aliniate cu engleza. Acest corp este liber disponibil. Pentru a obține o indicație privind calitatea bitexturilor extrase, antrenăm sistemele neuronale MT de bază pe datele extrase numai pentru 1886 de perechi de limbi și le evaluăm pe corpul TED, obținând scoruri BLEU puternice pentru multe perechi de limbi. Bitexturile WikiMatrix par să fie deosebit de interesante pentru a instrui sisteme MT între limbi îndepărtate fără a fi nevoie să pivotați prin limba engleză.', 'si': 'අපි විකිපිඩියා වලින් 96 භාෂාවේ සාමාන්\u200dය වාක්ෂාවක් නිසා ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් සමාන්\u200dය වාක්ෂාවක් අරගෙන යන්න ප්\u200dරවේශයක අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි එක්ක පිළිගන්න ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාව සීමාවෙන්නේ නැහැ, ඒත් අපි පද්ධතියෙන් සියළුම භාෂා ජ සම්පූර්ණයෙන්, අපිට පුළුවන් 16720 වෙනස් භාෂා ජාති වලින් සමාන්තික වචන සමාන්තික වචන සමාන්තික වචන සමාන්ති මේ කොර්පුස් නිදහස් වෙන්න පුළුවන්. බිට්ක්ස්ට් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන පෙන්නන්න, අපි 1886 භාෂාවල් ජෝඩා වලින් විතරයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ න්\u200dයුරල් MT පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය පද්ධතියේ  විකිමැට්\u200dරික්ස් බිට්ක්ස්ට් වල විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් MT පද්ධතිය දුර භාෂාවක් අතර ඉංග', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo pristup na osnovu integracije multijezičkih rečenica da bi automatski izvukli paralelne rečenice iz sadržaja članaka Wikipedije na 96 jezika, uključujući nekoliko dijalekata ili niskih jezika resursa. Ne ograničavamo proces izvlačenja na usklađenje sa engleskim, ali sistematski razmišljamo o svim mogućim jezičkim parovima. Ukupno možemo izvući 135M paralelne rečenice za 16720 različitih jezičkih parova, od kojih se samo 34M poravnaju sa engleskim. Ovaj korpus je slobodno dostupan. Da bi dobili indikaciju o kvaliteti izvlačenih biteksa, trenirali smo neuralne MT početne sisteme na rudenim podacima samo 1886. jezičkim parovima, i procenili ih na TED korpusu, ostvarili jake BLEU rezultate za mnoge jezičke parove. WikiMatrix bitexts izgleda da su posebno zanimljivi da treniraju MT sisteme između udaljenih jezika bez potrebe da pivotiraju kroz engleski jezik.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qaab ku saleysan hadal luuqado kala duduwan si aan automatic uga soo bixino qoraalaha lambarka ah oo ku qoran qoraalka Wikipedia oo ku qoran 96 luuqadood, kuwaas oo ku qoran luuqado kala duwan ama luuqado hoose ah. Xiriiridda la soo saarista uma xadeynno mid ku qoran Ingiriis, laakiin si rasmi ah ayaan si qaab ah ugu fiirsanaynaa labada luqadood oo suurtagal ah. In total, we are able to extract 135M parallel sentences for 16720 different language pairs, out of which only 34M are aligned with English.  Qasabkaas waxey si xor ah u heli karaan. Si loo helo tusaale ku saabsan tijaabada qaniinka la soo saaray, waxaan ku tababaraynaa nidaamka hoose ee MT ee ku qoran macluumaadka lagu kaydiyey oo kaliya 1886 luuqadood oo kaliya, waxaana ku qiimeynayaa kooxda TED, si aad u hesho scoraha xoogga badan ee BLEU labo badan. Qaybaha WikiMatrix waxay u muuqataa inay si gaar ah u xiiseysaa in lagu tababaro nidaamka MT oo ku dhexaysa luuqadaha fog, iyadoon u baahnayn in afka Ingiriiska lagu sameeyo.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar ett tillvägagångssätt baserat på flerspråkiga meningar inbäddade för att automatiskt extrahera parallella meningar från innehållet i Wikipediaartiklar på 96 språk, inklusive flera dialekter eller lågresursspråk. Vi begränsar inte utvinningsprocessen till anpassningar med engelska, men vi överväger systematiskt alla möjliga språkpar. Totalt kan vi extrahera 135M parallella meningar för 16720 olika språkpar, varav endast 34M är anpassade till engelska. Denna korpus är fritt tillgänglig. För att få en indikation på kvaliteten på de extraherade bitexterna tränar vi neurala MT baslinjesystem på de extraherade data endast för 1886 språkpar, och utvärderar dem på TED-korpusen, vilket uppnår starka BLEU-poäng för många språkpar. WikiMatrix bitexterna verkar vara särskilt intressanta för att träna MT-system mellan fjärran språk utan att behöva svänga genom engelska.', 'ta': 'விகிபிடியா கட்டுரைகளின் உள்ளடக்கத்திலிருந்து 96 மொழிகளில் இருந்து இணைய வாக்கியங்கியாக வெளியேற்றுவதற்கு, பல மொழி வாக்கியின் அடிப்படையில்  நாம் வெளியேற்றும் செயல்பாட்டை ஆங்கிலத்துடன் ஒத்திசைப்படுத்தும் வரையறுக்கவில்லை, ஆனால் நாம் கணினியில 16720 வேறு வித்தியாசமான மொழி ஜோடிகளுக்கு 135M இணைய வாக்குகளை நாம் வெளியேற்ற முடியும், அதில் 34M மட்டும் ஆங்கிலத்துடன்  இந்த கோர்பாஸ் இலவசமாக கிடைக்கும். வெளியேற்றப்பட்ட பிட்ஸின் தரம் பற்றி ஒரு குறிப்பை கிடைக்கும் பொழுது, நாம் நிறைந்த தரவுகளின் புதிய MT முறைமைகளை பயிற்சி செய்து, 1886 மொழிகளின் ஜோடி மட்டும்  விக்கிமாட்ரிக்ஸ் பிடிக்ஸ் சிறப்பாக ஆர்வமாக இருக்கிறது தொலைதூர மொழிகளுக்கு இடையே MT அமைப்புகளை பயிற்சி செய்ய வேண', 'ur': 'ہم ایک طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں جو بہت سی زبان جماعت پر بنیاد ہے کہ ویکیپیڈیا کے مجموعہ سے 96 زبانوں میں ویکیپیڈیا کے مجموعہ سے مختلف جماعت نکالیں، اور بہت سی ڈائیلکت یا کم رسسوس زبانوں میں شامل ہوتے ہیں. ہم انگلیسی کے مطابق انگلیسی کے مطابق اٹھانے کی پروسس کو محدود نہیں کرتے، لیکن ہم سیستماتیک طور پر تمام ممکن زبان جوڑوں کو سمجھتے ہیں. ہم نے 16720 مختلف زبان جوڑوں کے لئے 135M مشابہ جماعتوں کو اٹھا سکتے ہیں، ان میں سے صرف 34M انگلیسی کے ساتھ متصل ہوتے ہیں. یہ کورپوس آزاد سے موجود ہے۔ اخراج ہوئے بیٹکسٹ کے کیفیت کے ذریعے ایک نشانی حاصل کرنے کے لئے، ہم نے اخراج ہوئے بیٹ بیٹ لین سیستموں کو صرف 1886 زبان جوڑوں کے لئے تربیت کی ہے، اور انہیں TED کورپوس میں ارزش کریں، بہت سی زبان جوڑوں کے لئے قوی بل یو سی کائٹ حاصل کریں۔ ویکیماتریکس بیٹکسٹ خیلی دلچسپ ہے کہ ٹیٹی زبانوں کے درمیان ٹیٹی سیستموں کی آموزش کریں بغیر انگلیسی کے ذریعہ پیوٹ کرنے کی ضرورت.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw approċċ ibbażat fuq inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ sentenzi multilingwi biex awtomatikament neħħew sentenzi paralleli mill-kontenut ta’ artikoli tal-Wikipedia f’96 lingwa, inklużi diversi dijaletti jew lingwi b’riżorsi baxxi. Ma nillimitawx il-proċess ta’ estrazzjoni għal allinjamenti mal-Ingliż, iżda b’mod sistematiku nikkunsidraw il-pari lingwistiċi possibbli kollha. B’kollox, nistgħu nġibdu 135M sentenza parallela għal 16720 par ta’ lingwi differenti, li minnhom 34M biss huma allinjati mal-Ingliż. Dan il-korpus huwa disponibbli liberament. To get an indication on the quality of the extracted bitexts, we train neural MT baseline systems on the mined data only for 1886 languages pairs, and evaluate them on the TED corpus, achieving strong BLEU scores for many language pairs.  It-testi bit-test tal-WikiMatrix jidhru li huma partikolarment interessanti biex jitħarrġu sistemi MT bejn lingwi distanti mingħajr il-ħtieġa li l-Ingliż jiċċaqlaq.', 'ml': '96 ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വിക്കിപിഡിയയുടെ ഉള്ളില്\u200d നിന്നും പാരാലില്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d സ്വയം പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d പല ഭാഷയിലുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d അടി ഇംഗ്ലീഷുമായി പ്രക്രിയയുടെ പ്രക്രിയയെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരിധിയിലാക്കുന്നില്ല, പക്ഷെ സാധ്യമായി എല്ലാ ഭാഷ ജോടികള മൊത്തത്തില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് 135M പാരാളില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷ ജോടികള്\u200dക്ക് 16720 വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷയുടെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d കഴ ഈ കോര്\u200dപ്പസ് സ്വതന്ത്ര്യമാണ്. പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട കടിക്സ്റ്റുകളുടെ സ്വാധീനത്തില്\u200d ഒരു അടയാളം ലഭ്യമാക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, മൈനിഡ് ഡേറ്റാ മാത്രം 1886 ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്ക് മാത്രം ന്യൂറല്\u200d എംടി ബെസ്ലി വിക്കിമാറ്റിക്സിന്റെ കടിപ്പുകള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലൂടെ പിവോട്ട് ചെയ്യാന്\u200d ആവശ്യമില്ലാത്ത എംടി സിസ്റ്റം പരിശീലിപ്പ', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp dựa trên sự nhúng câu nói đa dạng để tự động trích ra các câu song song trong nội dung của Wikipedia trong lớp tiếng 96, bao gồm nhiều phương ngữ hay ngôn ngữ ít tài nguyên. Chúng tôi không giới hạn tiến trình khai thác để phù hợp với tiếng Anh, nhưng chúng tôi luôn cân nhắc các cặp ngôn ngữ có thể. Tổng thể, chúng ta có thể trích ra 135M các câu song song cho 16720 các cặp ngôn ngữ khác nhau, từ đó chỉ 34M được xếp theo tiếng Anh. Tập đoàn này có thể tự do. Để xác định chất lượng của các gen được tách ra, chúng tôi đào tạo hệ thống cơ bản sóng thần kinh trên các hệ thống cơ sở cơ sở cơ sở cơ quan đường truyền chỉ đặt ra các dữ liệu liệu gốc cho các cặp ngôn ngữ 1886, và đánh giá chúng trên tập thể Ted, đạt điểm BleU mạnh cho nhiều cặp ngôn ngữ. Những hình thể của WikiLMa Trận có vẻ đặc biệt thú vị để huấn luyện các hệ thống MTV giữa những ngôn ngữ xa xôi mà không cần phải xoay chuyển qua tiếng Anh.', 'uz': "Biz 96 tillarda Wikipedia maqola tarkibida bir necha dialeklar yoki bir necha rasm tillardan foydalanuvchi so'zlarni avtomatik olib tashlash uchun bir xil so'zlar asosida yaratganmiz. Biz ingliz tili bilan birlashtirish jarayonini chegara qilmaymiz, lekin biz oddiy tillar sonlarini tasavvur qilamiz. Umumiy, biz 16720 boshqa tillar uchun 135M parallel so'zlarni ajratish mumkin, ulardan faqat 34M ingliz tili bilan birlashtirilgan. Ushbu korpus buyruq mavjud. Ko'rsatilgan bittlarning sifatida aniqlash uchun biz bir necha xil maʼlumot uchun neyural MT asosiy tizimini faqat 1886 tillar uchun o'rganamiz va ularni TED corpusda qiymatlashiz, ko'p tillar uchun katta BLEU qiymatlarini bajaramiz. Name", 'bg': 'Представяме подход, базиран на многоезични вграждания на изречения, за автоматично извличане на паралелни изречения от съдържанието на статиите в Уикипедия на 96 езика, включително няколко диалекта или езика с нисък ресурс. Ние не ограничаваме процеса на извличане до подравняване с английски език, но систематично разглеждаме всички възможни езикови двойки. Общо можем да извлечем 135 милиона паралелни изречения за 16720 различни езикови двойки, от които само 34 милиона са подравнени с английския. Този корпус е свободен. За да получим индикация за качеството на извлечените биттекстове, ние обучаваме неврални базови системи на МТ върху извлечените данни само за 1886 езикови двойки и ги оценяваме на TED корпуса, постигайки силни резултати за много езикови двойки. Битекстовете на УикиМатрикс изглеждат особено интересни за обучение на МТ системи между отдалечени езици, без да е необходимо да се върти през английски.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en tilgang baseret på flersprogede sætningsindlejringer til automatisk at udtrække parallelle sætninger fra indholdet af Wikipedia artikler på 96 sprog, herunder flere dialekter eller lav ressource sprog. Vi begrænser ikke udtrækningsprocessen til tilpasninger med engelsk, men vi overvejer systematisk alle mulige sprogpar. I alt er vi i stand til at udtrække 135M parallelle sætninger for 16720 forskellige sprogpar, hvoraf kun 34M er justeret til engelsk. Dette korpus er frit tilgængeligt. For at få en indikation på kvaliteten af de udvundne bitekster træner vi neurale MT baseline systemer på de udvundne data kun for 1886 sprogpar, og evaluerer dem på TED korpus, hvilket opnår stærke BLEU scores for mange sprogpar. WikiMatrix biteksterne synes at være særligt interessante til at træne MT-systemer mellem fjerne sprog uden behov for at dreje gennem engelsk.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een aanpak gebaseerd op meertalige zinsinsluitingen om automatisch parallelle zinnen uit de inhoud van Wikipedia-artikelen te extraheren in 96-talen, inclusief verschillende dialecten of low-resource talen. We beperken het extractieproces niet tot uitlijningen met het Engels, maar we houden systematisch rekening met alle mogelijke taalparen. In totaal zijn we in staat om 135M parallelle zinnen te extraheren voor 16720 verschillende taalparen, waaruit slechts 34M zijn uitgelijnd met het Engels. Dit corpus is vrij beschikbaar. Om een indicatie te krijgen over de kwaliteit van de geëxtraheerde bitexts, trainen we neurale MT baseline systemen op de gemine data alleen voor 1886 taalparen, en evalueren ze op het TED corpus, waardoor we sterke BLEU scores behalen voor veel taalparen. De WikiMatrix bitexts lijken bijzonder interessant te zijn om MT-systemen tussen verre talen te trainen zonder de noodzaak om door het Engels te draaien.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo pristup na temelju ugrađenja multijezičkih rečenica kako bi se automatski izvukao paralelne rečenice iz sadržaja članaka Wikipedije na 96 jezika, uključujući nekoliko dijalekata ili niskih jezika resursa. Ne ograničavamo proces izvlačenja na usklađenje s engleskim, ali sistematski smatramo sve moguće jezičke pare. Ukupno možemo izvući 135M paralelne rečenice za 16720 različitih jezičkih parova, od kojih se samo 34M poređuje engleskim. Ovaj korpus je slobodno dostupan. Da bismo dobili indikaciju o kvaliteti izvlačenih biteksa, trenirali smo neuralne MT početne sustave na rudenim podacima samo 1886. jezičkim parovima i procijenili ih na TED korpusu, ostvarili jake BLEU rezultate za mnoge jezičke pare. WikiMatrix bitexts izgleda posebno zanimljiv za treniranje MT sustava između udaljenih jezika bez potrebe za pivotom kroz engleski jezik.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan pendekatan berdasarkan kalimat berbilang bahasa untuk secara otomatis mengekstrak kalimat paralel dari isi artikel Wikipedia dalam 96 bahasa, termasuk beberapa dialekt atau bahasa sumber daya rendah. Kita tidak membatasi proses ekstraksi untuk alignment dengan bahasa Inggris, tapi kita secara sistematis mempertimbangkan semua pasangan bahasa yang mungkin. Secara total, kita dapat mengekstrak kalimat paralel 135M untuk 16720 pasangan bahasa yang berbeda, dari mana hanya 34M disesuaikan dengan bahasa Inggris. Korpus ini tersedia secara bebas. Untuk mendapatkan indikasi tentang kualitas bitext ekstraksi, kita melatih sistem MT saraf dasar pada data tambang hanya untuk pasangan bahasa 1886, dan mengevaluasi mereka di korpus TED, mencapai skor BLEU yang kuat untuk banyak pasangan bahasa. Teks gigitan WikiMatrix tampaknya sangat menarik untuk melatih sistem MT antara bahasa jauh tanpa membutuhkan pivot melalui bahasa Inggris.', 'fa': 'ما یک روش را بر اساس جمله\u200cهای زیادی زبان نشان می\u200cدهیم تا جمله\u200cهای متفاوتی را از محتوای مقاله\u200cهای ویکیپدیا در ۶۹ زبان خارج کنیم، شامل چندین دیالکت یا زبانهای کم منبع. ما فرایند خارج کردن را برای تطبیق کردن با انگلیسی محدود نمی کنیم، ولی سیستم\u200cپذیر همه جفت\u200cهای زبان ممکن را در نظر می\u200cگیریم. در کل، ما می توانیم ۱۳۳ میلیون جمله مشابه برای جفت زبانی متفاوت سال ۱۹۶۲ استخراج کنیم، که فقط 34میلیون با انگلیسی مشابه دارند. این کورپوس آزاد در دسترس است. برای یادآوری از کیفیت بیکست\u200cهای خارج شده، سیستم\u200cهای پایین\u200cخط عصبی MT روی داده\u200cهای معدنی فقط برای جفت زبان\u200cهای ۱۸۸۶ آموزش می\u200cدهیم، و آنها را روی کورپوس TED ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم، با رسیدن امتیاز\u200cهای قوی BLEU برای جفت زبان\u200cهای بسیاری. ویکیماتریکس ها به نظر می رسند که ویکیماتریکس خیلی جالب است که سیستم های MT بین زبانهای دور آموزش دهند بدون نیازی که به انگلیسی پیوند دهند.', 'ko': '우리는 96개 언어의 위키백과 문장 내용에서 몇 가지 사투리나 저자원 언어를 포함한 평행 문장을 자동으로 추출하는 방법을 제시했다.우리는 추출 과정과 영어의 일치를 제한하지 않지만, 우리는 가능한 모든 언어 쌍을 체계적으로 고려했다.전체적으로 말하자면, 우리는 16720종의 서로 다른 언어를 위해 1350만 개의 평행문장을 추출할 수 있는데, 그 중에서 3400만 개만이 영어와 일치한다.이 자료 라이브러리는 무료로 제공된다.추출된 비트 텍스트의 질을 파악하기 위해 1886개 언어 쌍의 발굴 데이터에서만 신경기계 번역 기선 시스템을 훈련하고 TED 어료 라이브러리에서 이를 평가함으로써 많은 언어 쌍에서 높은 BLEU 점수를 얻었다.WikiMatrix bitexts는 영어를 중심으로 하지 않고 원격 언어 사이에서 기계 번역 시스템을 훈련하는 데 특히 관심이 있는 것 같다.', 'de': 'Wir stellen einen Ansatz vor, der auf mehrsprachigen Satzbedingungen basiert, um automatisch parallele Sätze aus dem Inhalt von Wikipedia-Artikeln in 96-Sprachen zu extrahieren, einschließlich mehrerer Dialekte oder ressourcenschonender Sprachen. Wir beschränken den Extraktionsprozess nicht auf Angleichungen mit Englisch, sondern berücksichtigen systematisch alle möglichen Sprachpaare. Insgesamt sind wir in der Lage 135M parallele Sätze für 16720 verschiedene Sprachpaare zu extrahieren, aus denen nur 34M auf Englisch ausgerichtet sind. Dieses Korpus ist frei verfügbar. Um einen Anhaltspunkt für die Qualität der extrahierten Bitexte zu erhalten, trainieren wir neuronale MT-Baseline-Systeme nur für 1886-Sprachpaare und werten sie auf dem TED-Korpus aus, um starke BLEU-Werte für viele Sprachpaare zu erzielen. Die WikiMatrix Bitexts scheinen besonders interessant zu sein, um MT-Systeme zwischen entfernten Sprachen zu trainieren, ohne dass man durch Englisch schwenken muss.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kutengeneza mbinu inayotokana na hukumu ya lugha mbalimbali ili kutengeneza hukumu za kibinafsi kutoka kwenye makala yaliyopo katika lugha 96 za Wikipedia, ikiwa ni pamoja na lugha kadhaa au rasilimali ndogo. Hatuizuizi mchakato wa kutengeneza kwa ajili ya kujipanga kwa lugha ya Kiingereza, lakini kwa mfumo tunafikiria wanandoa wa lugha zote zinazowezekana. Kwa ujumla, tunaweza kuondoa sentence zinazofanana na 135M kwa ajili ya wanaume tofauti wa lugha 16720, ambazo ni 34M tu zinaunganishwa na Kiingereza. Huu makampuni yanapatikana kwa uhuru. Ili kupata dalili juu ya kiwango cha viungo vilivyotolewa, tunafundisha mfumo wa msingi wa MT wa neura katika takwimu za madini pekee kwa ajili ya lugha 1886, na kutathmini katika makampuni ya TED, kupata vipimo vikali vya BLEU kwa ajili ya viwili vingi vya lugha. The WikiMatrix bitexts seem to be particularly interesting to train MT systems between distant languages without the need to pivot through English.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n toegang gebaseer op multitaalse setnings om automaties parallele setnings uit die inhoud van Wikipedia-artikels in 96 tale te uitpak, insluitend verskeie dialekte of lae-hulpbron tale. Ons beperk nie die uittrekking proses na gelykings met Engels nie, maar ons het sistematies alle moontlike taal paar aangeneem. In totaal is ons in staat om 135M parallele setnings vir 16720 verskillende taal paar te uittrek, uit wat slegs 34M met Engels gelyk word. Hierdie korpus is vry beskikbaar. Om 'n indikasie te kry oor die kwaliteit van die uitgevoerde bitakste, tref ons neurale MT basisleine stelsels op die mineerde data slegs vir 1886 tale paar, en evalueer hulle op die TED korpus, tot sterk BLEU-punte vir baie taal paar toe. Die WikiMatrix bitexts lyk besonderlik interessant om MT stelsels tussen afgeleë tale te tren sonder die nodig om deur Engels te pivoteer.", 'tr': 'Biz birn채챌e dilli s철zleri Wikipedi첵any흫 96 dilde parallel s철zlerini 철z-철z체ne 챌ykarmak 체챌in bir 첵ala첵y힊y 챌ykar첵arys. I흫lis챌e 챌yky힊 prosesini bejerme첵채ris emma sistematik bilen 채hli m체mkin dil 챌iftleri d체힊체n첵채ris. Toplumatda 16720-nji dil 챌ift 체챌in 135M parallel s철zlerimizi a챌yp bileris we olary흫 i챌inden di흫e 34M i흫lis챌e 챌yk첵ar. Bu korpus bo힊 bolup bil첵채r. 횉aly힊 bitekleri흫 kalitesini g철rkezmek 체챌in, biz miner datularynda di흫e 1886 dil 챌ift sany 체챌in neural MT baseline sistemalary 철wred첵채ris we olary흫 TED korpusynda de흫le첵채ris we g체첵챌li BLEU dil 챌ift sanyny 첵etir첵채ris. WikiMatrix bitekleri i흫lis챌e s철z bermegi gerek bolmadyk bolsa MT sistemalary uzak diller arasynda 철wrenmek 체챌in gyzykly g철r체n첵채r.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një qasje bazuar në përmbajtje të fjalëve shumëgjuhëse për të nxjerrë automatikisht fjalë paralele nga përmbajtja e artikujve të Wikipedias në 96 gjuhë, duke përfshirë disa dialekte apo gjuhë me burime të ulëta. Ne nuk e kufizojmë procesin e nxjerrjes në përputhje me anglishtin, por ne sistematikisht konsiderojmë të gjitha çiftet e mundshme gjuhësh. Në përgjithësi, ne jemi në gjendje të nxjerrim 135 M fraza paralele për 16720 çifte gjuhësh të ndryshme, nga të cilat vetëm 34M janë të përshtatshme me anglishtin. Ky korpus është i lirë në dispozicion. Për të marrë një tregim mbi cilësinë e teksteve të nxjerra, ne trajnojmë sistemet nervore MT bazë në të dhënat e minave vetëm për çiftet e gjuhëve 1886 dhe i vlerësojmë në korpus TED, duke arritur rezultate të forta BLEU për shumë çifte gjuhësh. Tekstet e WikiMatrix duken veçanërisht interesante për të trajnuar sistemet MT midis gjuhëve të largëta pa nevojën për të shkuar nëpërmjet anglisht.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի մոտեցում, որը հիմնված է բազլեզու նախադասությունների ներդրման վրա, որպեսզի ավտոմատ հանենք զուգահեռ նախադասությունները Վիքիփեդիայի հոդվածների պարունակությունից 96 լեզուներով, ներառյալ մի քանի դիալեկտներ կամ ցածր Մենք չենք սահմանափակում վերացման գործընթացը անգլերենի հետ կապված հարաբերությունների վրա, բայց մենք համակարգչաբար հաշվի առնում ենք բոլոր հնարավոր լեզվի զույգերը: Ընդհանուր առմամբ, մենք կարող ենք 135M զուգահեռ նախադասություններ ստանալ 16720 տարբեր լեզվի զուգավորների համար, որոնցից միայն 34M-ը համապատասխանում են անգլերենի հետ: Այս կորպոսը ազատ հասանելի է: Որպեսզի հնարավորություն ստանանք ստացված կտրվածքների որակի մասին, մենք վարժեցնում ենք նյարդային MT հիմնական համակարգերը հանած տվյալների վրա միայն 1886 լեզվի զույգերի համար, և գնահատում ենք դրանք TED-ի կորպոսի վրա, հասնելով շատ լեզվի զույգերի համար ուժեղ ԲԼ ՎիքիՄատրիքսի կտրվածքները հատկապես հետաքրքիր են թվում MT համակարգերի ուսումնասիրելու հեռավոր լեզուների միջև առանց անգլերեն պտտվելու կարիքի:', 'az': 'Biz çoxlu dil cümlələrə dayanan bir approach göstəririk ki, Wikipedia maddələrinin içərisində 96 dildə paralel cümlələri avtomatik olaraq çıxartmaq üçün, bir çoxlu dialekt və yaxud düşük ressurs dillərini də dahil edərik. İngilizce ilə müəyyən edilmək üçün extraction prosesini müəyyən etmədik, amma sistematik olarak bütün mümkün dil çiftləri düşünürük. Toplam 16720 dil çiftləri üçün 135M paralel cümlələri çıxara bilərik, içərisindən ancaq 34M İngilizce ilə çəkilir. Bu korpus özgür olaraq faydalanır. Ekstra bitextlərin keyfiyyətini göstərmək üçün, mayın məlumatlarında nöral MT baseline sistemlərini ancaq 1886 dillərin çift üçün təhsil edirik və onları TED korpusında təhsil edirik, çox dil çift üçün güclü BLEU nöqtələrini yetiririk. WikiMatrix bitexts özellikle ilginç görünür ki, uzaq dillər arasında MT sistemlərini İngilizce dilindən pivot etmək lazımdır.', 'am': 'በ96 ቋንቋ ውስጥ ካለው Wikipedia ጽሑፎች እና በብዙ ቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች ወይም ጥቂት የክፍለ ዕድል ቋንቋዎች ውስጥ ካለው ተቃውሞ የሚያስፈልገውን የግንኙነት ቃላት አቅርብ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የውጤት ፕሮግራሙን እንግሊዝኛ ጋር ለመቀላቀል አላደረግንም ነገር ግን በሥርዓት የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ዓይነቶችን ሁሉ እናስብ፡፡ In total, we are able to extract 135M parallel sentences for 16720 different language pairs, out of which only 34M are aligned with English.  ይህ ኮርፓስ ነጻ ነው። በተወጡት ብጤቶች ላይ ማስታወቂያውን ለማግኘት፣ ለብዙዎች ቋንቋዎች የBLEU scores ለማግኘት በብዙ ቋንቋዎች ዓይነቶች ብቻ ለ1886 ቋንቋዎች የሚኖሩትን የኒሩኤል MT መሳሪያ ሲስተማርን እናሳውቃቸዋለን፡፡ የWikiMatrix ጽሑፎች የሩቅ ቋንቋዎች መካከል ያሉትን MT ስርዓቶች ለማስተማር የሚጠያየቁ ይመስላል፤ በንግግሊዝኛ በመስመር አይስፈልግም፡፡', 'ca': "Presentam un enfocament basat en incorporacions de frases multilingües per extrair automàticament frases paralleles del contingut d'articles de Wikipedia en 96 llengües, incloent varis dialectes o llengües de baix recursos. No limitam el procés d'extracció a alliniaments amb l'anglès, però sistemàticament considerem tots els parells de llenguatges possibles. En total, podem extrair 135M frases paralleles per 16720 parells de llenguatges diferents, de les quals només 34M estan allinjats amb l'anglès. Aquest corpus està lliurament disponible. Per obtenir una indicació sobre la qualitat dels textos extraïts, entrenem sistemes neuronals de MT basal en les dades minerades només per 1886 parells de llengües, i les evaluem al corpus TED, obtenint puntuacions BLEU fortes per molts parells de llengües. Els textos de bits de WikiMatrix semblen particularment interessants per formar sistemes MT entre llengües remotes sense la necessitat de girar a través de l'anglès.", 'bn': 'আমরা ৯৬ ভাষায় উইকিপিডিয়া প্রবন্ধের বিষয়বস্তু থেকে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্যারালেল শাস্তি বের করার ভিত্তিতে একটি উপায় উপস্থাপন করি, যার মধ্যে বেশ কয় আমরা ইংরেজীর সাথে সংযুক্ত করার প্রক্রিয়াকে সীমাবদ্ধ করি না, কিন্তু আমরা সিস্টেমিতভাবে সকল সম্ভাব্য ভাষার জ সম্পূর্ণভাবে আমরা ১৬৭০ ভাষার জোড়ার জন্য ১৩৫ মিটার প্যারালেল শাস্তি বের করতে পারি, যার মধ্যে শুধুমাত্র ৩৪ এম ইংরেজি  এই কোর্পাস স্বাধীনতা পাওয়া যাচ্ছে। To get an indication on the quality of the extracted bitexts, we train neural MT baseline systems on the mined data only for 1886 languages pairs, and evaluate them on the TED corpus, achieving strong BLEU scores for many language pairs.  উইকিম্যাট্রিক্সের কামড় বিশেষ করে মনে হচ্ছে দূরবর্তী ভাষার মধ্যে এমটি সিস্টেম প্রশিক্ষণ করার জন্য বিশেষ করে মজার বিষয়। ইং', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo pristup na temelju integracije multijezičkih rečenica kako bi automatski izvukli paralelne rečenice iz sadržaja članaka Wikipedije na 96 jezika, uključujući nekoliko dijalekata ili niskih jezika resursa. Ne ograničavamo proces izvlačenja na usklađenje s engleskim, ali sistematski smatramo mogućim jezičkim parovima. Ukupno možemo izvući 135M paralelne rečenice za 16720 različitih jezičkih parova, od kojih se samo 34M poravnaju sa engleskim. Ovaj korpus je slobodno dostupan. Da bismo dobili indikaciju o kvaliteti izvlačenih biteksa, trenirali smo neuralne MT početne sisteme na rudenim podacima samo za 1886 jezičkih parova, i procijenili ih na TED korpusu, ostvarili jake BLEU rezultate za mnoge jezičke parove. WikiMatrix bitexts izgleda da su posebno zanimljivi da treniraju MT sisteme između udaljenih jezika bez potrebe da pivotiraju kroz engleski jezik.', 'et': 'Esitame mitmekeelsetel lausete manustamisel põhinevat lähenemisviisi, et automaatselt eraldada paralleelseid lauseid Wikipedia artiklite sisust 96 keeles, sealhulgas mitmes murdes või vähese ressursiga keeles. Me ei piira ekstraheerimisprotsessi inglise keelega, vaid kaalume süstemaatiliselt kõiki võimalikke keelepaare. Kokku on meil võimalik eraldada 135M paralleelset lauset 16720 erineva keelepaari kohta, millest ainult 34M on joondatud inglise keelega. See korpus on vabalt kättesaadav. Ekstrakteeritud bitekstide kvaliteedi näitamiseks treenime kaevandatud andmetel neuraalseid MT baassüsteeme ainult 1886 keelepaari kohta ja hindame neid TED korpuses, saavutades paljude keelepaaride jaoks tugevad BLEU skoorid. WikiMatrixi bitekstid tunduvad eriti huvitavad olevat MT süsteemide koolitamiseks kaugete keelte vahel, ilma et oleks vaja pöörata läbi inglise keele.', 'fi': 'Esitämme monikielisiin lauseupotuksiin perustuvan lähestymistavan, jonka avulla Wikipedia-artikkeleiden sisällöstä voidaan automaattisesti poimia rinnakkaisia lauseita 96 kielellä, mukaan lukien useita murteita tai vähävaraisia kieliä. Emme rajoita uuttamisprosessia linjauksiin englannin kanssa, vaan tarkastelemme systemaattisesti kaikkia mahdollisia kielipareja. Yhteensä pystymme poimimaan 135M rinnakkaislausetta 16720 eri kieliparille, joista vain 34M on linjattu englannin kanssa. Korpus on vapaasti saatavilla. Saadaksemme viitteen purettujen bitekstien laadusta, koulutamme neuraalisia MT-perusjärjestelmiä louhittuun dataan vain 1886 kieliparille ja arvioimme niitä TED-korpusella saavuttaen vahvat BLEU-pisteet monille kielipareille. WikiMatrix-bitekstit näyttävät olevan erityisen mielenkiintoisia kouluttaa MT-järjestelmiä kaukaisten kielten välillä ilman tarvetta kääntää läpi Englanti.', 'cs': 'Představujeme přístup založený na vícejazyčném vložení vět k automatickému extrahování paralelních vět z obsahu článků Wikipedie v 96 jazycích, včetně několika dialektů nebo jazyků s nízkými zdroji. Proces extrakce neomezujeme na sladění s angličtinou, ale systematicky zvažujeme všechny možné jazykové páry. Celkem jsme schopni extrahovat 135M paralelní věty pro 16720 různé jazykové páry, z nichž pouze 34M jsou zarovnány s angličtinou. Tento korpus je volně dostupný. Abychom získali indikaci kvality extrahovaných bitextů, trénujeme neuronové MT základní systémy na těžených datech pouze pro jazykové páry 1886 a vyhodnocujeme je na TED korpusu, čímž dosahujeme silného BLEU skóre pro mnoho jazykových párů. Bitexty WikiMatrixu se zdají být obzvláště zajímavé pro trénování MT systémů mezi vzdálenými jazyky bez nutnosti točit angličtinou.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntukno sistem sing basa kanggo nggambar luwih-luwih bantuan kanggo nggambar aturan karo penjelongan sing luwih akeh nggawe luwih operasi ning token Awak dhéwé ora nggunakake perusahaan kanggo nggawe Inggris, nggonane dhewe sistematik susahne kabèh basa sing apik. Umum wigatining, kita iso nggambar cara-cara uga kenal karo cara-cara uga cara-cara sing kalah-cara uga cara-cara-cara sing kanggo 1 ulih cara-cara sing kalah-cara-cara sing arep karo Inggris Kowe kabèh iki dipunangé kebebasan Mbok ndheke ngomong kalite sing nggambar bitxts, kéné gêngêngêngé sistem kuwi MT sing nyeangé nggawe datang miner kanggo ngono perusahaan anyar, lan ngêngêngêngé kuwi ngêngêngé karo pok-pok sing nggawe masara banget kanggo nyengé diwong liyané Wulkane wigatik-wigatik', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים גישה מבוססת על תוספות משפטים רבות שפות כדי להוציא באופן אוטומטי משפטים מקבילים מתוכן מאמרים ויקיפדיה ב-96 שפות, כולל כמה דיאלקטים או שפות משאבים נמוכות. We do not limit the extraction process to alignments with English, but we systematically consider all possible language pairs.  בסך הכל, אנחנו מסוגלים להוציא משפטים מקבילים של 135 מיליון עבור 16720 זוגות שפות שונות, מהן רק 34 מיליון מתאימים לאנגלית. הקורפוס הזה זמין בחינם. To get an indication on the quality of the extracted bitexts, we train neural MT baseline systems on the mined data only for 1886 languages pairs, and evaluate them on the TED corpus, achieving strong BLEU scores for many language pairs.  The WikiMatrix bitexts seem to be particularly interesting to train MT systems between distant languages without the need to pivot through English.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo pristop, ki temelji na večjezičnih vdelavah stavkov za samodejno ekstrakcijo vzporednih stavkov iz vsebine Wikipedijskih člankov v 96 jezikih, vključno z več narečji ali jeziki z nizkimi viri. Procesa ekstrakcije ne omejujemo na usklajevanje z angleščino, temveč sistematično upoštevamo vse možne jezikovne pare. Skupaj lahko izvlečemo 135M vzporednih stavkov za 16720 različnih jezikovnih parov, od katerih je samo 34M usklajenih z angleščino. Ta korpus je prosto dostopen. Da bi dobili indikacijo o kakovosti ekstrahiranih bitekstov, usposabljamo nevronske osnovne sisteme MT na izkopanih podatkih samo za 1886 jezikovnih parov in jih ocenimo na korpusu TED, s čimer dosežemo močne rezultate BLEU za številne jezikovne pare. Biteksti WikiMatrix se zdijo še posebej zanimivi za usposabljanje MT sistemov med oddaljenimi jeziki brez potrebe po vrtenju skozi angleščino.', 'ha': "Tuna gabatar da wani matsayi a kan salon da aka shigar da maganar mulki-lingui don ya iya fitar da cire masu daidaita farat ɗaya daga cikin harshen WiKiedia da ke cikin zanen 96, kamar da wasu hoteli masu ƙaranci ko kuma ƙasan-resource. Ba mu ƙayyade aikin zartarwa zuwa masu daidaita da Ingiriya, kuma amma muna ƙaddara koda dukkan lugha masu yiwuwa. Gansa da haka, za mu iya iya sami cire 135M masu daidaita wa 16640 nau'i biyu dabam-daban, daga gare su kawai na haɗi 34M da Ingirinsa. Wannan nauyi yana da buɗari. To, dõmin ka sãmi wata alama a kan sifar birnin da aka samu, muna tafiyar da ma'anar MT-na'urar kwamfyuta a kan danne-danne da aka ƙara kawai dõmin lugha 1886, kuma ana ƙaddara su a kan nau'in TeD, da gaskata score mai ƙarfi na BLEU don nau'in biyu masu yawa. Kiki Matrix ɗin sune mai amfani da ya zama mai amfani da wa'anar tsari na MT tsakanin harshen masu nĩsa kuma ba da amfani da ya yi pivot zuwa Ingiriya.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱེད་མི་ཐུབ་པ་ལས་འཕར་རིས་ལྟར་མཚམས་མེད། ཡོངས་བསྒྲུབ་ཀྱིས། ང་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་སྐད་ཀྱི་གཉིས་མིན་འདུག་གི་སྔར་སྒྲིག་ཆ་སྐྱེས་ཚིག་ཕྱིར་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད། སྒུང་འདི་རང་དབང་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་རེད། To get an indication of the quality of the extracted bitexts, we train neural MT baseline systems on the mined data only for 1886 languages pairs, and evaluate them on the TED corpus, achieving strong BLEU scores for many languages pairs. The mined data only for 1886 languages pairs has been set. WikiMatrix་ཚིག་དག་གི་བར་ཐག་རིང་གི་སྐད་ཆ་དབར་གྱི་འགྱུར་བར་ཐག་རིང་ལ་ཁྱད་པར་མཐུན་སྣང་བ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'ChEMU-Ref : A Corpus for Modeling Anaphora Resolution in the Chemical Domain', 'ar': 'مرجع ChEMU: مجموعة لنمذجة دقة الجناس في المجال الكيميائي', 'es': 'Chemu-REF: Un corpus para modelar la resolución de anáforas en el dominio químico', 'fr': 'Chemu-REF\xa0: Corpus pour la modélisation de la résolution des anaphores dans le domaine chimique', 'pt': 'ChEMU-Ref: Um Corpus para Modelar a Resolução de Anáforas no Domínio Químico', 'ja': 'ChEMU - Ref: A Corpus for Modeling Anaphora Resolution in the Chemical Domain', 'hi': 'ChEMU-Ref: रासायनिक डोमेन में मॉडलिंग Anaphora संकल्प के लिए एक कॉर्पस', 'zh': 'ChEMU-Ref曰:化学域拟无花果分辨率之语料库', 'ru': 'CHEMU-Ref: Корпус для Моделирования Разрешения Анафоры в Химической Домене', 'ga': 'ChEMU-Ref: Corpas chun Taifeach Anafóra a Shamhaltú sa Fhearann Ceimiceach', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'ChEMU-Ref: A Corpus for Modeling Anaphora Resolution in Chemical Domain', 'el': 'Ένα Σώμα για τη μοντελοποίηση της απόφασης της Ανάφορας στον χημικό τομέα', 'it': "ChEMU-Ref: Un corpo per modellare la risoluzione dell'anafora nel settore chimico", 'mk': 'ChEMU-Ref: Корпус за моделирање на резолуцијата на анафората во хемискиот домен', 'lt': 'ChEMU-Ref: A Corpus for Modelling Anaphora Resolution in the Chemical Domain', 'kk': 'ChEMU- Ref: Химикалық домендегі Anaphora айырмашылығын үлгілеу үшін корпус', 'ms': 'ChEMU-Ref: A Corpus for Modeling Anaphora Resolution in the Chemical Domain', 'mt': 'ChEMU-Ref: A Corpus for Modeling Anaphora Resolution in the Chemical Domain', 'ml': 'ChEMU-Ref: ചെമിക്കല്\u200d ഡോമെയിനിലെ അനഫ്രാ വിശദീകരണത്തിനുള്ള ഒരു കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ്', 'mn': 'ChEMU-Ref: Химийн домаар Анафорын шийдвэрлэлийг загварчлахын тулд', 'no': 'ChEMU- Ref: Eit korpus for modellering av anaforoppløysing i kjemisk domenet', 'pl': 'ChEMU-Ref: Korpus do modelowania rozdzielczości anafory w dziedzinie chemicznej', 'ro': 'ChEMU-Ref: Un corpus pentru modelarea rezoluției anaforei în domeniul chimic', 'sr': 'ChEMU-Ref: Korpus za modeliranje Anaforske rezolucije u hemijskom domenu', 'si': 'ChEMU- ref: රාසායික ඩෝමේන් වල ඇනාෆෝරා රිසෝලියෝජිත විශ්වාස කරන්න කෝර්පුස්', 'ta': 'ChEMU- Ref: சிமிக்கல் தளத்தில் மாதிரியும் Anaphora திரைத்திறனுக்கான ஒரு கோர்புஸ்', 'ur': 'CHEMU-Ref: رومیک ڈومین میں آنافورا روزی موڈل کرنے کے لئے ایک کورپوس', 'sv': 'ChEMU-Ref: En korpus för modellering av anafora resolution inom den kemiska domänen', 'so': 'ChEMU-Ref: A Corpus for Modeling Anaphora Resolution in the Chemical Domain', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tiêu chuẩn môi trường Anaphora trong lĩnh vực hóa học', 'bg': 'Корпус за моделиране на резолюцията на анафората в химическата област', 'nl': 'ChEMU-Ref: Een korpus voor het modelleren van Anafora Resolutie in het chemische domein', 'hr': 'ChEMU-Ref: Korpus za modeliranje Anaforske rezolucije u kemijskom domenu', 'da': 'ChEMU-Ref: Et korpus til modellering af anaphora opløsning på det kemiske område', 'de': 'ChEMU-Ref: Ein Korpus zur Modellierung von Anaphora Resolution im chemischen Bereich', 'ko': 'ChemU-Ref: 화학 분야 반지 분해 모델 자료 라이브러리', 'id': 'ChEMU-Ref: A Corpus for Modeling Anaphora Resolution in the Chemical Domain', 'fa': 'ChEMU-Ref: یک کورپوس برای مدل حل آنافورا در دامنه شیمیایی', 'sw': 'ChEMU-Ref: A Corpus for Modeling Anaphora Resolution in the Chemical Domain', 'tr': 'ChEMU-Ref:', 'af': "ChEMU- Ref: 'n Korpus vir Modelering Anafora Resolusie in die Chemiese Domein", 'sq': 'ChEMU-Ref: A Corpus for Modeling Anaphora Resolution in the Chemical Domain', 'am': 'ChEMU-Ref: A Corpus for Modeling Anaphora Resolution in the Chemical Domain', 'hy': 'ChEmU-Ռեֆ. Կորպուսը քիմիական բնագավառի անաֆորայի լուծումների մոդելավորման համար', 'az': 'ChEMU-Ref: Kimyasal Domenin Anafora 칂칬z칲n칲rl칲y칲n칲 Modell톛m톛k 칲칞칲n bir korpus', 'bn': 'ChEMU-Ref: কেমিকাল ডোমেইনে মডেলিং এনাফোরা রিসিউলেশনের জন্য একটি কোর্পাস', 'bs': 'ChEMU-Ref: Korpus za modeliranje Anaforske rezolucije u kemijskom domenu', 'ca': "ChEMU-Ref: Un Corpus per a Modelar la Resolució d'Anafòra en el Domini Químic", 'cs': 'ChEMU-Ref: Korpus pro modelování rozlišení anafory v chemické oblasti', 'et': 'ChEMU-Ref: A Corpus for Modeling Anaphora Resolution in the Chemical Domain', 'fi': 'ChEMU-Ref: A Corpus for Modeling Anaphora Resolution in the Chemical Domain', 'sk': 'ChEMU-Ref: Korpus za modeliranje resolucije anafore na kemijskem področju', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'ChEMU-Ref: Corpus for Modeling Anaphora Resolution in the Chemical Domain', 'jv': 'HEMU-Ref: A corpus kanggo model Anaphora Resolution in the Kemikal domain', 'bo': 'ChEMU-Ref:Chemical Domain'}
{'en': 'Chemical patents contain rich coreference and bridging links, which are the target of this research. Specially, we introduce a novel annotation scheme, based on which we create the ChEMU-Ref dataset from reaction description snippets in English-language chemical patents. We propose a neural approach to anaphora resolution, which we show to achieve strong results, especially when jointly trained over coreference and bridging links.', 'ar': 'تحتوي براءات الاختراع الكيميائية على مرجعيات غنية ووصلات تجسير ، والتي هي هدف هذا البحث. على وجه الخصوص ، نقدم مخططًا جديدًا للتعليقات التوضيحية ، بناءً عليه أنشأنا مجموعة بيانات ChEMU-Ref من مقتطفات وصف التفاعل في براءات الاختراع الكيميائية باللغة الإنجليزية. نقترح نهجًا عصبيًا لقرار الجاذبية ، والذي نظهر أنه يحقق نتائج قوية ، خاصةً عندما يتم تدريبه بشكل مشترك على الروابط المرجعية والجسور.', 'es': 'Las patentes químicas contienen abundantes enlaces de correferencia y puente, que son el objetivo de esta investigación. Especialmente, presentamos un esquema de anotación novedoso, basado en el cual creamos el conjunto de datos Chemu-REF a partir de fragmentos de descripción de reacciones en patentes químicas en inglés. Proponemos un enfoque neuronal para la resolución de anáforas, que demostramos para lograr resultados sólidos, especialmente cuando se entrenan conjuntamente sobre correferencias y enlaces puente.', 'pt': 'As patentes químicas contêm ricas correlações e links de ligação, que são o alvo desta pesquisa. Especialmente, apresentamos um novo esquema de anotação, com base no qual criamos o conjunto de dados ChEMU-Ref a partir de trechos de descrição de reação em patentes químicas em inglês. Propomos uma abordagem neural para resolução de anáforas, que mostramos alcançar resultados fortes, especialmente quando treinados em conjunto sobre links de correferência e ponte.', 'fr': "Les brevets sur les produits chimiques contiennent de riches liens de coréférence et de rapprochement, qui sont l'objet de cette recherche. En particulier, nous introduisons un nouveau schéma d'annotation, sur la base duquel nous créons le jeu de données Chemu-REF à partir d'extraits de description de réaction dans des brevets chimiques en anglais. Nous proposons une approche neuronale de la résolution des anaphores, dont nous montrons qu'elle donne de bons résultats, en particulier lorsqu'elle est entraînée conjointement sur la coréférence et les liens de pontage.", 'ja': '化学特許には、本研究の対象である豊富なコアリファレンスと橋渡しリンクが含まれています。特に、新しい注釈スキームを導入し、それに基づいて、英語の化学特許における反応記述スニペットからChEMU - Refデータセットを作成します。私たちは、アナフォラ解像度に対する神経アプローチを提案し、特にコアリファレンスと橋渡しリンクに関する共同訓練を受けた場合に強力な結果を達成することを示します。', 'hi': 'रासायनिक पेटेंट में समृद्ध कोरेफेरेंस और ब्रिजिंग लिंक होते हैं, जो इस शोध का लक्ष्य हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम एक उपन्यास एनोटेशन योजना पेश करते हैं, जिसके आधार पर हम अंग्रेजी भाषा के रासायनिक पेटेंट में प्रतिक्रिया विवरण स्निपेट से ChEMU-Ref डेटासेट बनाते हैं। हम एनाफोरा रिज़ॉल्यूशन के लिए एक तंत्रिका दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिसे हम मजबूत परिणाम प्राप्त करने के लिए दिखाते हैं, खासकर जब संयुक्त रूप से सह-सम्मेलन और ब्रिजिंग लिंक पर प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है।', 'ru': 'Химические патенты содержат богатую керновую и мостовую связи, которые являются целью этого исследования. Специально вводим новую схему аннотации, на основе которой создаем набор данных ChEMU-Ref из фрагментов описания реакции в англоязычных химических патентах. Мы предлагаем нейронный подход к разрешению анафоры, который мы демонстрируем для достижения сильных результатов, особенно когда совместно обучены по Coreference и мостиковых связей.', 'zh': '化学专利包富共指与桥接环节,本究之也。 特引入新注方案,基于该方,从英语化学专利之中片段创立ChEMU-Ref数集。 吾建一神经以决anaphora,吾证其可以成强大,特当因共指桥接合习之时。', 'ga': 'Tá croíláir agus naisc idirlinne saibhre sna paitinní ceimiceacha, agus is iad sin sprioc an taighde seo. Go speisialta, tugaimid scéim nótaí nua isteach, bunaithe ar a cruthaímid an tacar sonraí ChEMU-Ref ó ghearrthóga cur síos ar imoibriú i bpaitinní ceimiceacha Béarla. Molaimid cur chuige néarúil maidir le réiteach anafóra, rud a léirímid chun torthaí láidre a bhaint amach, go háirithe nuair a dhéantar comh-oiliúint ar chroílár agus naisc idirlinne.', 'ka': 'ჰემიკური პეტენტები აქვს ბედნიერი წარმოდგენები და ბრძანების კავშირები, რომლებიც ეს სწავლობას მიზეზი. განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ ახალი ანტორაციის სქემის შესახებ, რომელიც ჩვენ შევქმნით რეაქციის განსაკუთრების სნეპტების განსაკუთრებისთვის ჰიმიკური პეტენტებით. ჩვენ მინდა ნეიროლური წარმოდგენა ანაფორის წარმოდგენისთვის, რომელიც ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ძალიან წარმოდგენისთვის, განსაკუთრებით როდესაც ერთადერთად გაგრძნობა მ', 'hu': 'A kémiai szabadalmak gazdag korreferenciát és áthidaló kapcsolatokat tartalmaznak, amelyek ennek a kutatásnak a célja. Különösen egy új jegyzetelési sémát vezetünk be, amelynek alapján angol nyelvű vegyi szabadalmak reakcióleírásából készítjük el a ChEMU-Ref adatkészletet. Az anafóra felbontásának neurális megközelítését javasoljuk, amelyről azt mutatjuk, hogy erős eredményeket érünk el, különösen akkor, ha a coreferencia és az áthidaló kapcsolatok közösen képzettek.', 'el': 'Τα χημικά διπλώματα ευρεσιτεχνίας περιέχουν πλούσια συσχέτιση και γεφυρώνοντας δεσμούς, οι οποίοι είναι ο στόχος αυτής της έρευνας. Ειδικότερα, εισάγουμε ένα νέο σύστημα σχολιασμού, με βάση το οποίο δημιουργούμε το σύνολο δεδομένων από αποσπάσματα περιγραφής αντιδράσεων σε αγγλόφωνη χημικά διπλώματα ευρεσιτεχνίας. Προτείνουμε μια νευρωνική προσέγγιση για την επίλυση της αναφοράς, η οποία αποδεικνύεται ότι επιτυγχάνει ισχυρά αποτελέσματα, ειδικά όταν εκπαιδεύονται από κοινού πάνω από τη συγχορήγηση και τη γεφύρωση των συνδέσεων.', 'kk': 'Химиялық патенттер баяны сәйкестік және бұл зерттеулердің мақсатындағы сілтемелері бар. Біз жаңа жазбалар сұлбасын келтіреміз, оның негізінде ChEMU-Ref деректер жиынын ағылшын тілінің химикалық патенттерінің сипаттамасынан жасап береміз. Біз анафора айырмашылығына невралдық тәсілді ұсынамыз. Бұл күшті нәтижелерді жеткізу үшін көрсетеді, осылай-ақ біріктірілген және сілтемелерді біріктіргенде.', 'lt': 'Cheminiuose patentuose yra daug nuoseklumo ir ryšių, kurie yra šio tyrimo tikslas. Ypač įvedame naują anotacijų sistemą, pagal kurią sukuriame ChEMU-Ref duomenų rinkinį iš reakcijos aprašymo snippetų anglų kalbos cheminių patentų. Siūlome nervinį požiūrį į anaforos rezoliuciją, kuris rodo, kad pasiektume tvirtų rezultatų, ypač tuo atveju, kai bendrai mokomi dėl koreferencijos ir ryšių.', 'it': "I brevetti chimici contengono ricchi legami di coreferenza e ponte, che sono l'obiettivo di questa ricerca. In particolare, introduciamo un nuovo schema di annotazione, basato sul quale creiamo il dataset ChEMU-Ref da frammenti di descrizione delle reazioni in brevetti chimici in lingua inglese. Proponiamo un approccio neurale alla risoluzione dell'anafora, che dimostriamo di ottenere risultati forti, specialmente se addestrati congiuntamente su coreferenza e collegamenti di ponte.", 'mk': 'Chemical patents contain rich coreference and bridging links, which are the target of this research.  Специјално, воведуваме нова шема на анотации, врз основа на која го создаваме податочниот компјутер ChEMU-Ref од реакциски описи во хемиски патенти на англиски јазик. Предложуваме нервен пристап до резолуцијата на анафората, кој покажуваме за да постигнеме силни резултати, особено кога заеднички се обучуваат во врска со соодветноста и врските.', 'mn': 'Химийн патентууд баян зэрэгцээ, хөндлөн холбоотой холбоотой. Энэ нь энэ судалгааны зорилго. Ялангуяа, бид англи хэлний химийн патентүүдийн урвалын тодорхойлолтоос ChEMU-Ref өгөгдлийн санг үүсгэдэг шинэ анзааралтын загварыг танилцуулдаг. Бид Анафора шийдвэрлэлийн мэдрэлийн ойлголтыг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь хүчтэй үр дүнг гаргах боломжтой. Ялангуяа зөвшөөрөл болон холбоотой холбоотой байдлаар нийлүүлж суралцах үед.', 'mt': "Il-privattivi kimiċi fihom koerenza għolja u rabtiet bejn xulxin, li huma l-mira ta’ din ir-riċerka. Specially, we introduce a novel annotation scheme, based on which we create the ChEMU-Ref dataset from reaction description snippets in English-language chemical patents.  Aħna nipproponu approċċ newrali għar-riżoluzzjoni tal-anafora, li juru li niksbu riżultati b'saħħithom, speċjalment meta nħarrġu b'mod konġunt dwar il-koreferenza u r-rabtiet li jgħaqqdu.", 'ml': 'കെമിക്കല്\u200d പാറ്റെന്\u200dറുകളില്\u200d സമ്പന്നതയുള്ള കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസും ബ്രിഡിങ്ങിങ് ലിങ്കുകളും ഉണ്ട്, അതാണ് ഈ പഠനത്തിന്\u200dറ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അതിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നാം ChEMU-Ref ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. പ്രതി നമ്മള്\u200d അനഫ്രാ റിസ്റ്റേഷനിലേക്ക് ന്യൂറല്\u200d ചെയ്യാന്\u200d പ്രാദോധിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അത് ശക്തിയുള്ള ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നേടാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണി', 'ms': 'Paten kimia mengandungi kaitan dan sambungan yang kaya, yang merupakan sasaran penyelidikan ini. Khususnya, kami memperkenalkan skema anotasi baru, berdasarkan yang kami cipta set data ChEMU-Ref dari gambar reaksi snippets dalam paten kimia bahasa Inggeris. Kami cadangkan pendekatan saraf kepada resolusi anafora, yang kami tunjukkan untuk mencapai keputusan yang kuat, terutama apabila bersama-sama dilatih atas persamaan dan sambungan.', 'pl': 'Patenty chemiczne zawierają bogatą współzależność i pomosty, które są celem tych badań. W szczególności wprowadzamy nowatorski schemat adnotacji, na podstawie którego tworzymy zbiór danych ChEMU-Ref z fragmentów opisu reakcji w angielskojęzycznych patentach chemicznych. Proponujemy neuronowe podejście do rozdzielczości anafory, które pokazujemy osiąganie silnych rezultatów, zwłaszcza gdy wspólnie trenujemy nad koreferencją i pomostem.', 'sr': 'Kemijski patenti sadrže bogatu pristojnost i povezanje veza, koje su cilj ovog istraživanja. Posebno, predstavljamo novu annotaciju, na temelju kojeg stvaramo komplet podataka ChEMU-Ref iz snippeta opisa reakcija na engleskom hemijskom patentu. Predlažemo neuralni pristup rezoluciji anafore, koji pokazujemo da postignemo jake rezultate, posebno kada zajednički obučeni preko pristojnosti i povezivanja veza.', 'no': 'Chemical patents contain rich coreference and bridging links, which are the target of this research. Spesielt introduserer vi eit nytt notasjonsskjema, basert på at vi lager datasettet for ChEMU-Ref frå omskrivingssnippet i engelske kjemiske patenter. Vi foreslår ein neuraltilnærming til anaforoppløysing, som vi viser å oppnå sterke resultat, spesielt når vi kopla treng over koreferanse og bryting av lenkjer.', 'ro': 'Brevetele chimice conțin corefențe bogate și legături de legătură, care sunt ținta acestei cercetări. În special, introducem o nouă schemă de adnotare, pe baza căreia creăm setul de date ChEMU-Ref din fragmente de descriere a reacției în brevete chimice în limba engleză. Propunem o abordare neurală a rezoluției anaforei, pe care o demonstrăm că obține rezultate puternice, mai ales atunci când sunt instruiți în comun asupra coreferenței și legăturilor de legătură.', 'so': 'Chemical patents contain rich coreference and bridging links, which are the target of this research.  Si gaar ah, waxaynu soo bandhignaa qorshaha warqada ee warqada ah, kaas oo aan ku saleynaa qoraalka macluumaadka ChEMU-Ref oo ka soo bandhigaya qoraalka tilmaamaha warqada Ingiriis ku qoran xarumaha kemikiga ah. Waxaynu horumarinaynaa hab-dhaqaaq ah si aan u sameyno sameynta sawirada, taas oo aynu tusnaynaa inay helaan resultooyin xoog badan, khusuusan marka iskuul la barto xiriirka isbedelka iyo xiriirka isbedelka.', 'sv': 'Kemiska patent innehåller rika coreference- och överbryggningslänkar, som är målet för denna forskning. Speciellt introducerar vi ett nytt anteckningsschema, baserat på vilket vi skapar ChEMU-Ref datauppsättningen från reaktionsbeskrivningsutdrag i engelskspråkiga kemiska patent. Vi föreslår ett neuralt tillvägagångssätt för anafora upplösning, vilket vi visar att uppnå starka resultat, särskilt när vi gemensamt tränas över coreference och överbryggande länkar.', 'ta': 'சாதாரண பாதைகளில் பணக்கூடிய கோர்பென்ஸ் மற்றும் பிரிட்டிங் இணைப்புகள் உள்ளன, இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியின் இலக்க குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் ஒரு புதிய முறைமையை தெளிவுத்திறனுக்கு பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், அதை நாம் வலுவான முடிவுகளை அடைக்க காட்டுகிறோம், குறிப்ப', 'si': 'රාසායික ප්\u200dරතිපත්තියක් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්ප විශේෂයෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විස්තර ස්නිපෙට්ට් වල ඉංග්\u200dරීසි භාෂාව රාසායාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විස්තර ස අපි අනාෆෝරා රිසෝල්යුස් එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න පුළුවන්, ඒක අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ශක්තිමත් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ලැබෙන්න, වි', 'ur': 'ریاضی پٹینٹوں میں بہترین مہربانی اور پلینگ لینک ہیں، جو اس تحقیق کا موقع ہے. خاص طور پر، ہم نے ایک نئی اظہار کی تصویر پیش کریں، جس پر ہم نے ChEMU-Ref ڈیٹ سٹ بنایا ہے، انگلیسی زبان کے شیمیائی پٹینٹوں میں سپیٹ سے. ہم نے انفورا کے ذریعہ ایک نئورل طریقہ کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے، جسے ہم مضبوط نتائج پہنچانے کے لئے دکھاتے ہیں، مخصوصاً جب مہربانی اور لینکوں کے بارے میں مشترک تعلیم کی جاتی ہے۔', 'vi': 'Công nghệ hóa học chứa nhiều khả năng cao và kết nối, mục tiêu của nghiên cứu này. Đặc biệt, chúng ta sẽ giới thiệu một kế hoạch ghi chú mới, dựa trên đó chúng ta sẽ tạo ra tập tin tài liệu ChEMF-Ref từ các đoạn mô tả phản ứng trong sáng chế hóa học tiếng Anh. Chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp thần kinh tới giải quyết Anaphora, mà chúng tôi cho thấy để có kết quả mạnh, đặc biệt là khi tập hợp về hạn và kết nối.', 'uz': "Chemical patents ichki taxminan koreference va bir bogʻlamalarda mavjud. Bu ta'qindilar uchun maqsadi. Specially, we introduce a novel annotation scheme, based on which we create the ChEMU-Ref dataset from reaction description snippets in English-language chemical patents.  Biz anafora ravishda yaxshi narsa qilamiz. Bu narsalarni yaxshi natijalarni ko'rsatamiz, hususan birlashtirish va birlashtirish bogʻlamalari bilan birlashtirilganda.", 'bg': 'Химическите патенти съдържат богата кореференция и свързващи връзки, които са целта на това изследване. По-специално, въвеждаме нова схема за анотация, въз основа на която създаваме набор от данни от фрагменти за описание на реакциите в патенти на английски език за химикали. Предлагаме невронен подход към резолюцията на анафората, който доказваме, че постига силни резултати, особено когато съвместно се обучава за кореференция и свързване на връзки.', 'nl': 'Chemische octrooien bevatten rijke samenhang- en overbruggingsverbindingen, die het doel van dit onderzoek zijn. Speciaal introduceren we een nieuw annotatieschema, op basis waarvan we de ChEMU-Ref dataset creëren uit fragmenten van reactiebeschrijving in Engelstalige chemische octrooien. We stellen een neurale benadering voor van anafora resolutie, die we laten zien om sterke resultaten te bereiken, vooral wanneer gezamenlijk getraind over coreference en overbrugging links.', 'hr': 'Kemijski patenti sadrže bogatu pristojnost i povezanje premeštaja, koji su cilj ovog istraživanja. Posebno, predstavljamo novu annotaciju, na temelju kojeg stvaramo komplet podataka ChEMU-Ref iz snippeta opisa reakcija na engleskom hemijskom patentu. Predlažemo neuralni pristup rezoluciji anafore, kojoj pokazujemo da postignemo jake rezultate, posebno kada zajedno obučavamo pri pristojnosti i premeštanju veza.', 'da': 'Kemiske patenter indeholder rige coreference- og broforbindelser, som er målet for denne forskning. Især introducerer vi en ny annotationsordning, baseret på hvilken vi skaber ChEMU-Ref datasættet ud fra reaktionsbeskrivelsesuddrag i engelsk-sprogede kemiske patenter. Vi foreslår en neural tilgang til anaphora opløsning, som vi viser at opnå stærke resultater, især når vi træner i fællesskab om coreference og broforbindelser.', 'ko': '화학 특허는 풍부한 상호 참조와 교량 관계를 포함하는 것이 본 연구의 목표이다.특히 우리는 새로운 주석 방안을 소개했고 이를 바탕으로 영어 화학 특허의 반응 설명 부분에서 ChemU-Ref 데이터 집합을 만들었다.우리는 손가락을 돌려 해소하는 신경 방법을 제시했는데, 특히 공지와 브리지 연결을 통해 연합 훈련을 할 때 좋은 효과를 거둘 수 있다는 것을 증명했다.', 'de': 'Chemische Patente enthalten reiche Zusammenhänge und Brückenverbindungen, die das Ziel dieser Forschung sind. Speziell stellen wir ein neuartiges Annotationsschema vor, auf dessen Basis wir den ChEMU-Ref Datensatz aus Reaktionsbeschreibungsschnitten in englischsprachigen chemischen Patenten erstellen. Wir schlagen einen neuronalen Ansatz zur Auflösung von Anaphoren vor, der nachweislich starke Ergebnisse erzielt, insbesondere wenn wir gemeinsam über Coreferenz und Brückenverbindungen trainieren.', 'id': 'Paten kimia mengandung banyak koreferensi dan hubungan, yang merupakan sasaran penelitian ini. Khususnya, kami memperkenalkan skema anotasi baru, berdasarkan yang kami menciptakan dataset ChEMU-Ref dari deskripsi reaksi snippets dalam paten kimia bahasa Inggris. Kami mengusulkan pendekatan saraf untuk resolusi anafora, yang kami tunjukkan untuk mencapai hasil yang kuat, terutama ketika bersama-sama dilatih atas koreferensi dan hubungan jembatan.', 'fa': 'Patents Chemical contain rich coreference and bridging links, which are the target of this research. مخصوصا، ما یک برنامه نویسی را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که بر اساس آن مجموعه داده\u200cهای ChEMU-Ref را از توصیف واکنش\u200cها در patents شیمیایی زبان انگلیسی ایجاد می\u200cکنیم. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش عصبی برای حل\u200cسازی آنفورا، که نشان می\u200cدهیم تا نتیجه\u200cهای قوی را بررسی کنیم، مخصوصا وقتی که با هم در مورد ارتباط و پیوند\u200cسازی ارتباط آموزش داده می\u200cشویم.', 'sw': 'Vifaa vya kemikali vina viungo vya utajiri na viungo vya pamoja, ambavyo vina lengo la utafiti huu. Kwa ujumla, tunaonyesha mpango wa kutangaza riwaya, kwa mujibu wa kutengeneza taarifa za ChEMU-Ref kutoka kwenye vipande vya maelezo yanayoelezea kwa njia za kemikali katika lugha ya Kiingereza. Tunazipendekeza mbinu za kisasa za kutatua suluhisho la simu, ambalo tunaonyesha kupata matokeo makubwa, hasa pale ambapo tumejifunza kwa pamoja kuhusiana na viungo vya kuunganisha.', 'af': "Chemiese patente bevat ryk koreferensie en bruiding skakels, wat is die doel van hierdie ondersoek. Spesiaal, ons introduseer 'n nuwe annotasie skema, gebaseer op wat ons die ChEMU-Ref datastel skep van reaksie beskrywing snippets in Engelstaal chemiese patente. Ons voorstel 'n neurale toegang tot anafora-oplossing, wat ons wys om sterke resultate te bereik, veral wanneer saamstig onderwerp is oor koreferensie en bruiding van skakels.", 'tr': 'Kimyasal patenler baýyş uzmançylyk we baglaýyş baglaýyşlary bardyr. Bu araştyrmanyň maksady. Adatça, biz bir täze täzelikler taslaýarys, munuň üstine ChEMU-Ref veri setirini iňlis dilinde kimyasal patenlerden döretýäris. Biz anafora çözümleşmegi nuýral ýagdaýa teklip edip, muny güýçli netijelere ýetmegimizi görkeýäris. Özellikle näsazlyk we baglaýyşlaryň üstünde bir yerleşik şeklinde bilim alyp bilýän wagtymyz üçin üýtgedildi.', 'sq': 'Patentet kimike përmbajnë korreferencë të pasur dhe lidhje të lidhura, të cilat janë objektivi i kërkimit. Veçanërisht, ne paraqesim një skemë të re anotacioni, bazuar në të cilën ne krijojmë kompletin e të dhënave ChEMU-Ref nga përshkrimi i reaksioneve në patentat kimike në gjuhën angleze. Ne propozojmë një qasje nervore ndaj rezolutës së anaforës, që ne tregojmë për të arritur rezultate të forta, veçanërisht kur trajnohen së bashku lidhur me koreferencën dhe lidhjet e lidhjeve të lidhura.', 'am': 'የኪሞክራዊ ፕሮግራሞች ሀብታሞች የኮርፌንስ ግንኙነት እና የግንኙነት ግንኙነት ይኖራሉ፤ ይህ ምርመራ አግኝቷል፡፡ በተለይም፣ በንግግሊዝኛ ቋንቋ-ቻማዊ ሚካሌ ገጾች የChEMU-Ref ዳታተሮችን በመፍጠር ላይ የመረጃ ዘዴን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በአንፎራ ፍሬዎችን ለማግኘት እናሳየዋለን፣ ይልቁንም የኮርፌንስ እና ግንኙነትን በመጠቀም ጊዜ እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Քիմիական բացատրությունները պարունակում են հարուստ կորեֆերանսներ և կապեր, որոնք այս ուսումնասիրության նպատակն են: Հատկապես, մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր annoտացիոն ծրագիր, որը հիմնված է այն, որ մենք ստեղծում ենք ChEmmU-Ռեֆ տվյալների համակարգը արձագանքի նկարագրման կտորներից անգլերենով քիմիական բացատրություններում: Մենք առաջարկում ենք անաֆորայի լուծման նյարդային մոտեցում, որը ցույց է տալիս, որպեսզի հասնենք ուժեղ արդյունքներ, հատկապես երբ միասին վարժեցվում ենք հարաբերությունների և կապերի վերաբերյալ:', 'az': 'Kimyasal patenlərdə baxışlıq və bağlantılar var, bu araştırmanın məqsədilidir. Xüsusiyyətli olaraq, biz İngilizə dilində kimyasal patentlərində reaksiyonun təfsilməsindən ChEMU-Ref veri qurmağı təyin edirik. Biz anafora çözünürlüyünü nəyral tərzi təklif edirik, ki bu tərzi güclü sonuçlarını başa çıxartmaq üçün göstəririk, özellikle birlikdə mərhəmət və bağlantıları ilə birlikdə təhsil edildikdə.', 'ca': "Les patents químiques contenen una gran correferencia i enllaços de pont, que són l'objectiu d'aquesta investigació. Especialment, introduïm un nou esquema d'anotació, basat en el qual creem el conjunt de dades de ChEMU-Ref a partir de fragments de descripció de reacció en patents químiques de llenguatge anglès. Proposem un enfocament neuronal a la resolució de l'anàfora, que demostrem per aconseguir resultats forts, especialment quan treinem conjuntament sobre coreferència i enllaços de pont.", 'bs': 'Kemijski patenti sadrže bogatu pristojnost i vezu za prekidanje, koje su cilj ovog istraživanja. Posebno, predstavljamo novu annotaciju, na temelju kojeg stvaramo komplet podataka ChEMU-Ref iz snippeta opisa reakcija na engleskom hemijskom patentu. Predlažemo neuralni pristup rezoluciji anafore, koji pokazujemo da postignemo jake rezultate, posebno kada zajedno obučavamo pri pristojnosti i premeštanju veza.', 'cs': 'Chemické patenty obsahují bohaté koreference a překlenovací vazby, které jsou cílem tohoto výzkumu. Speciálně představujeme nové anotace schéma, na jehož základě vytváříme datovou sadu ChEMU-Ref z úryvků popisu reakcí v anglicky jazyčných chemických patentech. Navrhujeme neuronový přístup k rozlišení anafory, který ukazujeme, že dosahuje silných výsledků, zejména při společném tréninku nad koreferencí a mostováním vazeb.', 'bn': 'রাসায়নিক প্যাটেন্টের মধ্যে সমৃদ্ধ কোরেফারেন্স এবং ব্রিজিং লিঙ্ক আছে, যা এই গবেষণার লক্ষ্য। বিশেষ করে, আমরা একটি উপন্যাস বিজ্ঞাপন পরিকল্পনাকে পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই, ভিত্তিতে আমরা সিএইমু-রেফ ডাটাসেট তৈরি করি ইংরেজি ভাষায় রাসায়নিক প্যাটেন আমরা বিভিন্ন সিদ্ধান্তের প্রস্তাব করি, যা আমরা শক্তিশালী ফলাফল অর্জন করতে পারি, বিশেষ করে যখন যুক্ত কর্ফেন্স এবং ব্রিজিং লিঙ্কের উপর প্রশি', 'et': 'Keemiapatendid sisaldavad rikkalikku kaasviidet ja sidemeid, mis on käesoleva uuringu sihtmärk. Eelkõige tutvustame uut annotatsiooniskeemi, mille põhjal loome ChEMU-Ref andmekogumi reaktsioonikirjelduse lõikudest ingliskeelsetes keemiapatentides. Pakume välja neuraalse lähenemisviisi anafoori lahendamisele, mille tulemused saavutavad tugevaid tulemusi, eriti kui ühiselt õpetatakse ühiselt ühenduse ja sidemete üle.', 'fi': 'Kemialliset patentit sisältävät runsaasti yhteis- ja siltalinkkejä, jotka ovat tämän tutkimuksen kohteena. Erityisesti esittelemme uuden merkintäjärjestelmän, jonka pohjalta luomme ChEMU-Ref-aineiston englanninkielisten kemikaalipatenttien reaktiokuvauksen katkelmista. Ehdotamme neurolähestymistapaa anaforan resoluutioon, jonka osoitamme saavuttavan vahvoja tuloksia, varsinkin kun koulutamme yhdessä koreferenssi- ja siltalinkkejä.', 'ha': 'Maɓalli na ƙunsa da matalauci na koronanci da samun kodi, wanda ake so ne da wannan littãfin. Haƙĩƙa, Munã ƙara wani shirin sanarwa na nowaya, a bayan shi, muna sami da tsarin ChEMU-Ref daga taƙaitori masu motsi daga taƙaitori masu cikin harshen Ingiriya. Tuna goyya da hanyor neura zuwa rabo masu fassara na anafora, wanda Muke nũna wa su sami matsalar masu ƙarfi, hususan idan an yi wa kodi a kan korfiɗar da samurai.', 'sk': 'Kemični patenti vsebujejo bogato povezavo in premostitvene povezave, ki so cilj te raziskave. Predvsem predstavljamo novo shemo označevanja, na podlagi katere ustvarimo nabor podatkov ChEMU-Ref iz delčkov opisa reakcij v angleškem jeziku kemičnih patentov. Predlagamo nevronski pristop k resoluciji anafore, za katerega pokažemo, da dosega močne rezultate, še posebej pri skupnem usposabljanju na področju koreference in premostitve povezav.', 'jv': 'Peténé Kemik sing nduwe akeh nglanggar-nglanggar wigat lan nganggo tresno, sing ngendalikno bukanyar iki. Ingkang ngomong, kéné gunakake tresnaning pancene anyar, basa kang dibutuhke data set HEMU-Ref kang alaman pancene nggawe paten kerimik Inggris. Awak dhéwé ngerasah sistem nêrung kanggo Resolusi anaphora, sing bisa ngomong kejahatan dadi sing ditambah nêrung, kuwi sêngé awak dhéwé beraksi lan ijol-ijolan winih.', 'bo': 'Chemical patents contain rich coreference and bridging links, which are the target of this research. དམིགས་བསལ། ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་གྱི་གསར་གཏོང་འཆར་བ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱས། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་པར་ངེད་ཚོས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།', 'he': 'פטנטים כימיים מכילים עזרה עשירה וקשר, שהם המטרה של המחקר הזה. במיוחד, אנחנו מציגים מערכת ציונים חדשה, מבוססת בה אנו יוצרים את קבוצת הנתונים ChEMU-Ref מתיאור תגובה חתיכות בפטנטים כימיים בשפה אנגלית. אנו מציעים גישה עצבית לפתרון אנפורה, שאנחנו מראים כדי להשיג תוצאות חזקות, במיוחד כאשר מאומנים ביחד על קורפירנס וקשר גשר.'}
{'en': 'Searching for Search Errors in Neural Morphological Inflection', 'ar': 'البحث عن أخطاء البحث في الانعكاس الصرفي العصبي', 'fr': "Recherche d'erreurs de recherche dans l'inflexion morphologique neurale", 'pt': 'Procurando por erros de pesquisa na flexão morfológica neural', 'es': 'Búsqueda de errores de búsqueda en la inflexión morfológica neuronal', 'ja': '神経形態変形における検索エラーの検索', 'zh': '于神经形拐点中搜索谬误', 'ru': 'Поиск ошибок поиска в нейроморфологическом перегибе', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका रूपात्मक मोड़ में खोज त्रुटियों के लिए खोज', 'ga': 'Earráidí Cuardach a Chuardach in Infhilleadh Néar-mhirfeolaíoch', 'ka': 'ძიება შეცდომების ძებნა ნეირალური მორფოლოგიური ინფლიქციაში', 'el': 'Αναζήτηση σφαλμάτων αναζήτησης στην Νευρική Μορφολογική Ανατροπή', 'hu': 'Keresési hibák keresése Neural Morphological Inflection', 'it': "Ricerca di errori di ricerca nell'influenza morfologica neurale", 'kk': 'Нейралық морфологикалық инфлекциясында іздеу қатесі', 'lt': 'Ieškoti paieškos klaidų neurologinėje morfologinėje inflekcijoje', 'mk': 'Барање грешки во пребарувањето во невралната морфолошка инфлекција', 'ms': 'Mencari Ralat Gelintar dalam Infleksi Morfologi Neural', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d മോര്\u200dഫോളിക്കല്\u200d ഇന്\u200dഫ്ലെക്ഷനില്\u200d തെരച്ചില്\u200d പിശകുകള്\u200d തെരയുന്നു', 'mt': 'It-tiftix għal żbalji ta’ tiftix fl-Inflessjoni Morfoloġika Newrali', 'mn': 'Хайлтын алдаа хайж буй мэдрэлийн морфологик шинжилгээнд хайж байна.', 'no': 'Søkjer etter søkefeil i nøyralt morfologisk infleksjon', 'sr': 'Tražim greške u potrazi u neiralnoj morfološkoj inflekciji', 'pl': 'Wyszukiwanie błędów wyszukiwania w układzie neurologicznym', 'ro': 'Căutarea erorilor de căutare în inflexia morfologică neurală', 'si': 'හොයාගැනීමේ වැරදිලි හොයාගැනීමේ න්\u200dයූරාල් මොර්ෆෝලික විස්තරයෙන්', 'sv': 'Söker efter sökfel i neural morfologisk inflektion', 'so': 'Qaladaha raadinta ee Neural Morphological Inflex', 'ta': 'Neural Morphological Inflection ல் தேடுதல் பிழைகளை தேடுகிறது', 'ur': 'نیورال مورفولوژیکی انفلکس میں جہاد کی تخطاریں لگا رہی ہیں', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tìm kiếm các lỗi tìm kiếm về viêm phổi thần kinh', 'bg': 'Търсене на грешки при търсене в неврално морфологично влияние', 'nl': 'Zoeken naar zoekfouten in neurale morfologische inflectie', 'da': 'Søgning efter søgefejl i neural morfologisk inflektion', 'ko': '신경 형태 변화 중의 검색 오류를 찾다', 'de': 'Suche nach Suchfehlern in der neuromorphologischen Inflktion', 'id': 'Mencari Galat Pencarian dalam Infleksi Morfologi Neural', 'hr': 'Tražim greške pretraživanja u neiralnoj morfološkoj inflekciji', 'fa': 'جستجوی خطاهای جستجو در تغییر مورفولوژیک عصبی', 'sw': 'Kutafuta Tafuta Matatikio katika Uzungumzo wa Kimorphological', 'af': 'Soek vir Soektog Foute in Neural Morphological Infleksie', 'tr': 'Nytarol morfolojik senedi gözlemek üçin hatalary gözlenýär', 'am': 'የኩነቶች መረጃ', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մորֆոլոգիական ինֆլեկցիայի սխալներ որոնելը', 'bs': 'Tražim greške pretraživanja u neiralnoj morfološkoj inflekciji', 'sq': 'Duke kërkuar për gabime kërkimi në Infleksionin Morfologjik Neural', 'az': 'Nöral Morfolojik Infleksiyanın Arama Hatalarını axtarmaq', 'bn': 'Searching for Search Errors in Neural Morphological Inflection', 'ca': "Procurant Errors de Gueta en l'Inflexió Morfològica Neural", 'cs': 'Hledání chyb ve vyhledávání v neuronové morfologické inflaci', 'fi': 'Etsitään hakuvirheitä neuromorfologisesta häiriöstä', 'et': 'Otsinguvigade otsimine neuromorfoloogilises mõjutuses', 'jv': 'Search', 'sk': 'Iskanje iskalnih napak v nevralnem morfološkem vplivu', 'ha': '@ info: tooltip', 'he': 'מחפש שגיאות חיפוש בשפעה מורפולוגית נוירולית', 'bo': 'Neural Morphological Inflection ནང་དུ་འཚོལ་བཤེར་སྐབས་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་འཚོལ་བ'}
{'en': 'Neural sequence-to-sequence models are currently the predominant choice for language generation tasks. Yet, on word-level tasks, exact inference of these models reveals the empty string is often the global optimum. Prior works have speculated this phenomenon is a result of the inadequacy of neural models for language generation. However, in the case of morphological inflection, we find that the empty string is almost never the most probable solution under the model. Further, greedy search often finds the global optimum. These observations suggest that the poor calibration of many neural models may stem from characteristics of a specific subset of tasks rather than general ill-suitedness of such models for language generation.', 'ar': 'تعد نماذج التسلسل العصبي إلى التسلسل حاليًا الخيار السائد لمهام إنشاء اللغة. ومع ذلك ، في المهام على مستوى الكلمات ، يكشف الاستدلال الدقيق لهذه النماذج أن السلسلة الفارغة غالبًا ما تكون هي الأمثل عالميًا. تكهنت الأعمال السابقة بأن هذه الظاهرة هي نتيجة لعدم ملاءمة النماذج العصبية لتوليد اللغة. ومع ذلك ، في حالة الانعكاس الصرفي ، نجد أن السلسلة الفارغة لا تكاد تكون هي الحل الأكثر احتمالاً في النموذج. علاوة على ذلك ، غالبًا ما يجد البحث الجشع الأفضل عالميًا. تشير هذه الملاحظات إلى أن المعايرة الضعيفة للعديد من النماذج العصبية قد تنبع من خصائص مجموعة فرعية محددة من المهام بدلاً من الملاءمة العامة لمثل هذه النماذج لتوليد اللغة.', 'pt': 'Os modelos de sequência a sequência neurais são atualmente a escolha predominante para tarefas de geração de linguagem. No entanto, em tarefas em nível de palavra, a inferência exata desses modelos revela que a string vazia geralmente é o ótimo global. Trabalhos anteriores especularam que esse fenômeno é resultado da inadequação de modelos neurais para geração de linguagem. No entanto, no caso de inflexão morfológica, descobrimos que a corda vazia quase nunca é a solução mais provável sob o modelo. Além disso, a busca gulosa geralmente encontra o ótimo global. Essas observações sugerem que a má calibração de muitos modelos neurais pode resultar de características de um subconjunto específico de tarefas, em vez de uma inadequação geral de tais modelos para geração de linguagem.', 'fr': "Les modèles neuronaux séquence-à-séquence constituent actuellement le choix prédominant pour les tâches de génération de langage. Pourtant, pour les tâches au niveau des mots, l'inférence exacte de ces modèles révèle que la chaîne vide est souvent l'optimum global. Des travaux antérieurs ont émis l'hypothèse que ce phénomène est dû à l'inadéquation des modèles neuronaux pour la génération du langage. Cependant, dans le cas d'une inflexion morphologique, nous constatons que la chaîne vide n'est presque jamais la solution la plus probable dans le modèle. De plus, la recherche gourmande trouve souvent l'optimum global. Ces observations suggèrent que le mauvais étalonnage de nombreux modèles neuronaux peut provenir des caractéristiques d'un sous-ensemble spécifique de tâches plutôt que de la mauvaise adaptation générale de tels modèles pour la génération du langage.", 'es': 'Los modelos neuronales de secuencia a secuencia son actualmente la opción predominante para las tareas de generación del lenguaje. Sin embargo, en las tareas a nivel de palabra, la inferencia exacta de estos modelos revela que la cadena vacía es a menudo el óptimo global. Trabajos anteriores han especulado que este fenómeno es el resultado de la inadecuación de los modelos neuronales para la generación del lenguaje. Sin embargo, en el caso de la inflexión morfológica, encontramos que la cadena vacía casi nunca es la solución más probable bajo el modelo. Además, la búsqueda codiciosa a menudo encuentra el óptimo global. Estas observaciones sugieren que la mala calibración de muchos modelos neuronales puede deberse a las características de un subconjunto específico de tareas más que a la falta de adecuación general de dichos modelos para la generación del lenguaje.', 'ru': 'Нейронные модели последовательности-последовательности в настоящее время являются преобладающим выбором для задач генерации языка. Тем не менее, в задачах на уровне слов точный вывод этих моделей показывает, что пустая строка часто является глобальным оптимумом. Предыдущие работы предполагали, что это явление является результатом неадекватности нейронных моделей для генерации языка. Однако в случае морфологического перегиба мы находим, что пустая строка почти никогда не является наиболее вероятным решением в модели. Кроме того, жадный поиск часто находит глобальный оптимальный вариант. Эти наблюдения позволяют предположить, что плохая калибровка многих нейронных моделей может быть обусловлена характеристиками конкретного подмножества задач, а не общей непригодностью таких моделей для генерации языка.', 'ja': 'ニューラルシーケンスツーシーケンスモデルは、現在、言語生成タスクのための主な選択肢である。しかし、ワードレベルのタスクでは、これらのモデルの正確な推論は、空の文字列がしばしばグローバル最適であることを明らかにします。先行する著作では、この現象は言語生成のためのニューラルモデルの不十分さの結果であると推測されている。しかし、形態的な変形の場合、空の文字列はモデルの下ではほとんど最も可能性の高い解ではないことがわかります。さらに、貪欲な検索はしばしばグローバル最適であることを発見します。これらの観察は、多くのニューラルモデルの較正が不十分であることが、言語生成のためのそのようなモデルの一般的な不適切さではなく、タスクの特定のサブセットの特性に起因する可能性があることを示唆している。', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल वर्तमान में भाषा पीढ़ी के कार्यों के लिए प्रमुख विकल्प हैं। फिर भी, शब्द-स्तर के कार्यों पर, इन मॉडलों के सटीक अनुमान से पता चलता है कि खाली स्ट्रिंग अक्सर वैश्विक इष्टतम होती है। पहले के कार्यों ने अनुमान लगाया है कि यह घटना भाषा पीढ़ी के लिए तंत्रिका मॉडल की अपर्याप्तता का परिणाम है। हालांकि, रूपात्मक मोड़ के मामले में, हम पाते हैं कि खाली स्ट्रिंग मॉडल के तहत लगभग कभी भी सबसे संभावित समाधान नहीं है। इसके अलावा, लालची खोज अक्सर वैश्विक इष्टतम पाती है। इन टिप्पणियों से पता चलता है कि कई तंत्रिका मॉडलों का खराब अंशांकन भाषा पीढ़ी के लिए इस तरह के मॉडल के सामान्य बीमार-अनुकूलता के बजाय कार्यों के एक विशिष्ट सबसेट की विशेषताओं से स्टेम हो सकता है।', 'zh': '神经序者,言成务之大体也。 然于单词级任务之中,精确推显空字符串常为全局最优。 前事推之,此言神经不足也。 然形拐点之情,空字符串几于模形之下。 此外,贪搜常得全局最优。 此观结果表明,众神经之校准,或出于特定任务子集,非言语之普不应也。', 'ga': 'Is iad samhlacha néaracha seicheamh-go-seicheamh an príomhrogha faoi láthair maidir le tascanna giniúna teanga. Ach, maidir le tascanna ar leibhéal na bhfocal, léiríonn tátal beacht na múnlaí seo go minic gurb í an teaghrán folamh an barr is fearr ar domhan. Tá tuairimíocht déanta ag saothair roimhe seo go bhfuil an feiniméan seo mar thoradh ar neamhdhóthanacht na múnlaí néaracha chun teanga a ghiniúint. I gcás infhilleadh moirfeolaíoch, áfach, feicimid nach í an teaghrán folamh an réiteach is dóichí faoin múnla riamh. Ina theannta sin, is minic a aimsíonn cuardach greedy an ceann is fearr ar domhan. Tugann na tuairimí seo le tuiscint go bhféadfadh an droch-chalabrú ar go leor samhlacha néaracha eascairt as tréithe fo-thacar ar leith de thascanna seachas as droch-oiriúnacht ghinearálta na múnlaí sin do ghiniúint teanga.', 'el': 'Νευρικά μοντέλα αλληλουχίας προς αλληλουχίας αποτελούν επί του παρόντος την κυρίαρχη επιλογή για εργασίες δημιουργίας γλωσσών. Ωστόσο, σε εργασίες σε επίπεδο λέξεων, η ακριβής εξαγωγή αυτών των μοντέλων αποκαλύπτει ότι η κενή συμβολοσειρά είναι συχνά το παγκόσμιο βέλτιστο. Προηγουμένες εργασίες έχουν υποθέσει ότι αυτό το φαινόμενο είναι αποτέλεσμα της ανεπάρκειας των νευρωνικών μοντέλων για τη δημιουργία γλωσσών. Ωστόσο, στην περίπτωση μορφολογικής καμπύλης, διαπιστώνουμε ότι η κενή συμβολοσειρά σχεδόν ποτέ δεν είναι η πιο πιθανή λύση κάτω από το μοντέλο. Επιπλέον, η άπληστη αναζήτηση συχνά βρίσκει το παγκόσμιο βέλτιστο. Αυτές οι παρατηρήσεις υποδηλώνουν ότι η κακή βαθμονόμηση πολλών νευρωνικών μοντέλων μπορεί να προέρχεται από χαρακτηριστικά ενός συγκεκριμένου υποσύνολου εργασιών και όχι από τη γενική κακή καταλληλότητα τέτοιων μοντέλων για τη δημιουργία γλωσσών.', 'hu': 'A neurális szekvencia-szekvencia modellek jelenleg a legfontosabb választás a nyelv generálásához. A szószintű feladatok esetében azonban ezeknek a modelleknek a pontos következtetése feltárja, hogy az üres karakterlánc gyakran a globális optimális. Korábbi munkák szerint ez a jelenség annak az eredménye, hogy a neurális modellek nem megfelelőek a nyelv generálásához. A morfológiai inflexió esetén azonban azt találjuk, hogy az üres húr szinte soha nem a modell legvalószínűbb megoldása. Továbbá, a kapzsi keresés gyakran találja meg a globális optimális. Ezek a megfigyelések azt sugallják, hogy számos neurális modell rossz kalibrálása a feladatok egy adott részhalmazának jellemzőiből eredhet, nem pedig az ilyen modellek általános nyelvgenerálására való alkalmatlanságából eredhet.', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური შემდეგ- დან- შემდეგ მოდელები ახლა ენის შემდეგი მონიშნულება. მაგრამ, სიტყვების სამუშაო დავალებში, ამ მოდელების მარტივი ინფრენცია აღმოჩნდება, რომ ცარიელი სიტყვები ხშირად არის გლობალური ოპტიმა. პირველი სამუშაო მუშაოები სპეკულაცია, რომ ეს ფექომენი არის ენერალური მოდელეების შეცდომა. მაგრამ, მორპოლოგიური ინფლექციის შემთხვევაში, ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ ცარიელი სტრიქცია უფრო არ არის ყველაზე შესაძლებელი მოდელის ქვემოთ. დამატებით, ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან გლობალური ოპტიმიმა იქნება. ამ მონაცემებების შესახებ, რომ ბევრი ნეიროლური მოდელების ცოტა კალიბრება შეიძლება განსაკუთრებული სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო მუშაო მოდელების განსაკუთრებით', 'lt': 'Šiuo metu vyraujantis kalbų kūrimo užduočių pasirinkimas yra nuo sekos į seką modeliai. Vis dėlto, kalbant apie žodžių lygmens užduotis, tiksli šių modelių išvada atskleidžia tuščią eilutę dažnai yra pasaulinis optimumas. Ankstesni darbai spekuliavo, kad šis reiškinys yra susijęs su neuralinių modelių nepakankamumu kalbų kūrimui. Vis dėlto morfologinio užkreipimo atveju mes nustatome, kad tuščia juosta beveik niekada nėra labiausiai tikėtinas sprendimas pagal model į. Be to, pagundžiusi paieška dažnai randa pasaulinį optimalų. Šie stebėjimai rodo, kad prastas daugelio nervų modelių kalibravimas gali būti susijęs su konkrečios užduočių pogrupio savybėmis, o ne su bendru tokių modelių netinkamu kalbų kūrimui.', 'kk': 'Тілді құру тапсырмаларының негізгі таңдау үлгілері. Бірақ сөз деңгейіндегі тапсырмаларында, бұл үлгілердің дұрыс түсініктері бос жолды жалпы оптималдық деп көрсетеді. Алдыңғы жұмыс бұл пайдаланушы тілді құру үшін невралдық моделдерінің тәуелсіздігін анықталды. Бірақ морфологиялық инфлекциясы болса, бос жол үлгісінің астындағы ең ықтимал шешім болмайды деп ойлаймыз. Қосымша, жалпы іздеу көптеген жүйелік оптималдығын табу. Бұл бақылаулар көптеген невралдық моделдердің кейбір калибрлері тілді құру үшін кейбір тапсырмалардың қасиеттерінен шығарылады деп ойлайды.', 'mk': 'Неуралните модели од секвенца до секвенца моментно се претежниот избор за задачите на генерација на јазици. Yet, on word-level tasks, exact inference of these models reveals the empty string is often the global optimum.  Претходните дела шпекулираа дека овој феномен е резултат на несоодветноста на нервните модели за генерација на јазици. Сепак, во случај на морфолошки прилив, откриваме дека празната линија скоро никогаш не е најверојатното решение под моделот. Понатаму, алчното пребарување честопати го наоѓа глобалниот оптимум. Овие набљудувања укажуваат на тоа дека лошата калибрација на многу нервни модели може да потекнува од карактеристиките на специфичниот подгруп задачи наместо општата лоша соодветност на ваквите модели за генерација на јазици.', 'ml': 'ഭാഷ തലമുറയുടെ ജോലികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പ്രധാന തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d. Yet, on word-level tasks, exact inference of these models reveals the empty string is often the global optimum.  ഭാഷ തലമുറയ്ക്കുള്ള ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡലുകളുടെ കാരണമാണ് ഈ സംഭവം മുമ്പ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നത്. എന്നാലും, മോഡിലെ ഏറ്റവും സാധ്യതയുള്ള പരിഹാരം ഒരിക്കലുമില്ല എന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട്, ലോഗ്യ തെരച്ചില്\u200d എപ്പോഴും ലോകത്തിന്റെ ഐച്ഛികം കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു. ഈ കാഴ്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു ഇത്തരം ഭാഷ തലമുറതലമുറയ്ക്കുള്ള മോഡലുകളുടെ പാവപ്പെട്ട മാതൃകങ്ങളുടെ സാധാരണയില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രത്', 'it': "I modelli sequenza-sequenza neurale sono attualmente la scelta predominante per le attività di generazione del linguaggio. Tuttavia, nei compiti a livello di parola, l'esatta inferenza di questi modelli rivela che la stringa vuota è spesso l'ottimale globale. Lavori precedenti hanno ipotizzato che questo fenomeno sia il risultato dell'inadeguatezza dei modelli neurali per la generazione del linguaggio. Tuttavia, nel caso di inflessione morfologica, troviamo che la stringa vuota non è quasi mai la soluzione più probabile sotto il modello. Inoltre, la ricerca avida spesso trova l'ottimale globale. Queste osservazioni suggeriscono che la scarsa calibrazione di molti modelli neurali può derivare dalle caratteristiche di un sottoinsieme specifico di compiti piuttosto che dall'inadeguatezza generale di tali modelli per la generazione del linguaggio.", 'mt': 'Il-mudelli tas-sekwenza newrali għas-sekwenza bħalissa huma l-għażla predominanti għall-kompiti tal-ġenerazzjoni tal-lingwi. Madankollu, fuq kompiti fil-livell tal-kliem, l-inferenza eżatta ta’ dawn il-mudelli turi li l-linja vojta ħafna drabi hija l-aħjar globali. Xogħlijiet preċedenti spekulaw dan il-fenomenu huwa riżultat tan-nuqqas ta’ adegwatezza ta’ mudelli newrali għall-ġenerazzjoni tal-lingwi. Madankollu, fil-każ ta’ inflezzjoni morfoloġika, isibu li l-qatgħa vojta kważi qatt mhi s-soluzzjoni l-aktar probabbli taħt il-mudell. Barra minn hekk, it-tfittxija għaqlija ħafna drabi ssib l-aħjar fid-dinja. Dawn l-osservazzjonijiet jissuġġerixxu li l-kalibrazzjoni ħa żina ta’ ħafna mudelli newrali tista’ tirriżulta minn karatteristiċi ta’ sottosett speċifiku ta’ kompiti minflok minn inadegwatezza ġenerali ta’ mudelli bħal dawn għall-ġenerazzjoni tal-lingwi.', 'mn': 'Үүний тархины дарааллаас дарааллын загварууд хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн даалгавруудын гол сонголт юм. Гэхдээ үг хэмжээний ажил дээр эдгээр загваруудын тодорхой халдвар нь хоосон стринг ихэвчлэн дэлхийн хамгийн сайн байдаг. Эхний ажиллах нь энэ явдал нь хэлний үеийн мэдрэлийн загварын бус байдлын үр дүн юм. Гэхдээ морфологийн нөлөөлөлийн тухай бид хоосон стринг загварын доор хэзээ ч хамгийн магадлал шийдвэр байхгүй гэдгийг олж мэднэ. Дараа нь, хүчирхийлэл хайх нь ихэвчлэн дэлхийн эерэг санааг олдог. Эдгээр ажиглалтууд нь олон мэдрэлийн загварын ядуу калибр нь хэлний үеийн үеийн ерөнхий зөв загваруудын харьцааны харьцааны харьцааны харьцаатай байж болно гэсэн үг.', 'pl': 'Neuronowe modele sekwencji-sekwencji są obecnie dominującym wyborem dla zadań generowania języków. Jednak w przypadku zadań na poziomie słów dokładne wnioskowanie tych modeli ujawnia, że pusty ciąg jest często globalnym optymalnym. Wcześniejsze prace spekulowały, że zjawisko to wynika z nieadekwatności modeli neuronowych do generowania języka. Jednak w przypadku zmiany morfologicznej stwierdzamy, że pusty ciąg nie jest prawie nigdy najbardziej prawdopodobnym rozwiązaniem w modelu. Co więcej, chciwe poszukiwania często znajdują globalny optymalny cel. Obserwacje te sugerują, że słaba kalibracja wielu modeli neuronowych może wynikać raczej z charakterystyki określonego podzbioru zadań, a nie z ogólnej nieprzydatności takich modeli do generowania języków.', 'no': 'Neural sequence- to- sequence- modeller er gjeldande valet for språk- oppgåver. Men på ordnivåoppgåver viser det nøyaktige inferensen av desse modelane at tomme strengen ofte er den globale optimum. Førre arbeid har spesifisert at denne fenomenen er ein resultat av inadekvantiteten av neuralmodeller for språk-generering. I tillegg til morfologiske infleksjon finn vi imidlertid at den tomme strengen er nesten aldri den mest sannsynlege løysinga under modellen. Dette finn ofte det globale optimum søket. Desse observasjonane tyder på at den dårlige kalibreringa av mange neuralmodeller kan stemme frå karakteristika av ein spesifikke undergruppe av oppgåver i staden for generelle feil av slike modeller for språk-generering.', 'sr': 'Neuralni modeli sekvence do sekvence trenutno su glavni izbor za zadatak generacije jezika. Ipak, na zadatkima na nivou riječi, točna infekcija ovih modela pokazuje da prazna žica često je globalna optima. Prednji rad je spekulirao da je ovaj fenomen rezultat neuralnih modela za generaciju jezika. Međutim, u slučaju morfološke inflekcije, smatramo da prazna žica skoro nikada nije najverovatnije rješenje pod modelom. Dalje, pohlepna potraga èesto naðe globalni optimum. Ove primedbe sugeriraju da siromašna kalibracija mnogih neuronskih modela može izaći iz karakteristika određenog podgrupe zadataka, a ne opšte loše odgovarajuće takvih modela za generaciju jezika.', 'ro': 'Modelele secvență-secvență neurală sunt în prezent alegerea predominantă pentru sarcinile de generare a limbilor. Cu toate acestea, la sarcinile la nivel de cuvinte, deducția exactă a acestor modele arată că șirul gol este adesea optimul global. Lucrările anterioare au speculat că acest fenomen este rezultatul insuficienței modelelor neurale pentru generarea limbajului. Cu toate acestea, în cazul inflexiunii morfologice, constatăm că șirul gol nu este aproape niciodată soluția cea mai probabilă sub model. Mai mult, căutarea lacomă găsește adesea optimul global. Aceste observații sugerează că calibrarea slabă a multor modele neuronale poate rezulta din caracteristicile unui anumit subset de sarcini, mai degrabă decât din nepotrivirea generală a unor astfel de modele pentru generarea limbajului.', 'so': 'Tusaaladaha koorsiga ee xiliga iyo xilliga marka la joogo waa doorashada guud ee hawlaha qaranka luqada. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, goobaha heerka ee hadalka, qaababkan waxaa lagu muujiyaa dhibaatooyin aad u adag, sida badan xadhigga madhan waa mid caalami ah. Shaqooyinka hore waxay ka fekereen xaaladan waa sabab aan ku filnayn modelalka neurada ee qarniga luuqada. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, haddii ay ku dhaqdhaqaaqdo dhaqdhaqaaqa morphological, waxaynu aragnaa in xadhigga madhan uusan weligeed ka ahayn xalalka ugu suurtagal modellka hoostiisa. Further, raadinta qiimo leh inta badan wuxuu helaa mid caalami ah. Aroortan waxay ka muuqan karaan in kalibsashada noocyada neurada badan ay ka timaadaan takhasuska kooxo gaar ah oo shaqada ka mid ah, taas oo aan ku habboonayn tusaalooyin cayiman oo afka ah.', 'ms': 'Model urutan-ke-urutan saraf adalah pilihan utama untuk tugas generasi bahasa. Namun, pada tugas aras perkataan, kesimpulan tepat model ini mengungkap rentetan kosong sering adalah optimum global. Prior works have speculated this phenomenon is a result of the inadequacy of neural models for language generation.  However, in the case of morphological inflection, we find that the empty string is almost never the most probable solution under the model.  Lagipun, pencarian serakah sering mencari optimum global. These observations suggest that the poor calibration of many neural models may stem from characteristics of a specific subset of tasks rather than general ill-suitedness of such models for language generation.', 'ta': 'மொழி உருவாக்கும் பணிகளுக்கான முக்கியமான தேர்வு. ஆனாலும், வார்த்தை- மட்டத்தின் செயல்களில், இந்த மாதிரிகளின் பாதிப்பு தெரியும் வெற்று சரம் பெரும்பாலாக உலக விர Prior works have speculated this phenomenon is a result of the inadequacy of neural models for language generation.  ஆனால், மாதிரியின் கீழ் மிகவும் சாத்தியமான தீர்வு அதற்கும், பொருள் தேடுதல் பெரும்பாலாகவே உலக விருப்பத்தேர்வை கண்டுபிடிக்கும். இந்த பார்வைகள் நினைக்கிறது நிறைய புதிய மாதிரிகளின் ஏழை அளவிடுதல் மாதிரி உருவாக்கத்திற்கு பதிலாக மொழி உருவாக்கும் மாதிரிகளின் பொது', 'sv': 'Neural sekvens-till-sekvens modeller är för närvarande det dominerande valet för språkgenereringsuppgifter. Men på ordnivåuppgifter avslöjar exakt slutsats av dessa modeller att den tomma strängen ofta är det globala optimalt. Tidigare arbeten har spekulerat att detta fenomen är ett resultat av otillräckliga neurala modeller för språkgenerering. Men vid morfologisk böjning finner vi att den tomma strängen nästan aldrig är den mest sannolika lösningen under modellen. Dessutom finner girig sökning ofta det globala optimala. Dessa observationer tyder på att dålig kalibrering av många neurala modeller kan bero på egenskaper hos en viss delmängd uppgifter snarare än allmän olämplighet hos sådana modeller för språkgenerering.', 'si': 'භාෂාව නිර්මාණය වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරධාන විකල්පයක් තෝරාගන්න. නමුත්, වචන- ලේවල් කාර්යාලයෙන්, මේ මොඩල් එකේ සිද්ධ විනාශය ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා කියලා හිස්සු ස්ට්\u200dරින්ට් එක මුලින් වැඩක් හිතන්නේ මේ සිද්ධ වෙන්නේ භාෂාව ප්\u200dරසිද්ධානය සඳහා න්\u200dයූරාල මොඩේල්ස් එක්ක නිර්මාණ නමුත්, මොර්ෆෝලෝගික් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන, අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් කියලා හොයාගන්නෙ නෑ කියලා හිටියා ක ඊට පස්සේ, විශ්වාස සොයාගන්න පුළුවන් සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසිකම හොයාගන්නවා. මේ බලන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා කියලා භාෂාව පරිමාණයෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ වලින් සා', 'ur': 'نئورل سطح-تا-سطح نمڈلوں میں فعلاً زبان پیدا کرنے کے کاموں کے لئے بہترین انتخاب ہیں. لیکن، کلمات-سطح کے کاموں پر، ان موڈلوں کی دقیق مضبوط تعلق ظاہر کرتا ہے کہ کھلی سیٹرینگ اکثر گلوبی اچھی ہے۔ پہلے کے کاموں نے یہ پھیر پھیر لیا ہے کہ زبان کی نسل کے لئے نئورل موڈل کی ناپاکیزگی کا نتیجہ ہے. However, in the case of morphological inflection, we find that the empty string is almost never the most likely solution under the model. اور اس کے بعد، گھوٹی تلاش کثرت سے گھوٹی اچھی تلاش پاتا ہے۔ یہ اظهار کی توصیف کرتی ہے کہ بہت سی نئورل موڈل کی کمزور کالیبرا کرنا زبان کی نسل کے لئے ایسے موڈل کی عمومی ناپسندیدگی کے بغیر کسی مشخص مطابق کے خصوصے سے نکل سکتا ہے.', 'uz': "Andoza moslamalar Lekin, so'z vazifalar bilan bu modellarning kichkina shaklni ko'rsatadi, bu boʻsh satrni ko'p umumiy parametrlar. Birinchi vazifalar bu holatni o'ylab ko'rsatadi, bu til generalida neyrol modellari yetarli emas. Lekin, morfologik inflektlarida, biz o'ylaymiz, boʻsh satr modeldagi eng eng eng muhimi yo'l emas. Ko'proq qidiruvni ko'proq dunyo parametrlarini topadi. Bu taʼminlovlar esa, ko'pchilik neyron modellarning qisqartmalarini o'zgartirish mumkin, bu tilning umumiy foydalanish modellaridan o'zgartirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Mẫu phân tử thần kinh là lựa chọn hàng đầu cho các công việc sản xuất ngôn ngữ. Tuy nhiên, trong các công việc cấp từ, ngụ ý chính xác của các mô hình này tiết lộ rằng chuỗi rỗng thường là tối ưu toàn cầu. Những tác phẩm trước đây cho rằng hiện tượng này là kết quả của sự thiếu sót của các mô hình thần kinh cho sản xuất ngôn ngữ. Tuy nhiên, trong trường hợp có biến đổi lịch sử, chúng tôi thấy rằng chuỗi rỗng hầu như không bao giờ là giải pháp khả thi nhất dưới mẫu. Thêm nữa, tìm kiếm tham lam thường tìm thấy tối ưu toàn cầu. Những quan sát này cho thấy việc cân chỉnh kém nhiều mô hình thần kinh có thể do đặc tính của một nhóm đặc biệt các công việc hơn là sự thiếu phù hợp thông thường của các mô-đun ngôn ngữ đó.', 'bg': 'Моделите от неврална последователност към последователност понастоящем са преобладаващият избор за задачи за генериране на език. И все пак, при задачи на ниво дума, точното заключение на тези модели показва, че празният низ често е глобален оптимален. Предишни работи предполагат, че това явление е резултат от недостатъчността на невронните модели за генериране на езика. Въпреки това, в случай на морфологична инфлекция, откриваме, че празната низ почти никога не е най-вероятното решение по модела. Освен това алчното търсене често намира глобалния оптимален вариант. Тези наблюдения предполагат, че лошото калибриране на много невронни модели може да произтича от характеристиките на конкретен поднабор от задачи, а не от общата непригодност на такива модели за генериране на език.', 'da': 'Neurale sekvens-til-sekvensmodeller er i øjeblikket det fremherskende valg til sproggenereringsopgaver. Men på ordniveau opgaver afslører den nøjagtige konklusion af disse modeller, at den tomme streng ofte er det globale optimale. Tidligere værker har spekuleret dette fænomen er et resultat af utilstrækkeligheden af neurale modeller til sproggenerering. I tilfælde af morfologisk bøjning finder vi dog, at den tomme streng næsten aldrig er den mest sandsynlige løsning under modellen. Desuden finder grådig søgning ofte det globale optimale. Disse observationer tyder på, at den dårlige kalibrering af mange neurale modeller kan skyldes karakteristika ved en bestemt delmængde af opgaver snarere end generel uhensigtsmæssighed af sådanne modeller til sproggenerering.', 'nl': 'Neurale sequence-to-sequence modellen zijn momenteel de belangrijkste keuze voor taalgeneratietaken. Bij taken op woordniveau blijkt echter dat de lege tekenreeks vaak het globale optimum is. Eerdere werken hebben gespeculeerd dat dit fenomeen het gevolg is van de ontoereikendheid van neurale modellen voor taalgeneratie. Echter, in het geval van morfologische buiging, vinden we dat de lege string bijna nooit de meest waarschijnlijke oplossing onder het model is. Bovendien vindt hebzuchtige zoektocht vaak het wereldwijde optimum. Deze observaties suggereren dat de slechte kalibratie van veel neurale modellen kan voortvloeien uit kenmerken van een specifieke subset van taken in plaats van algemene ongeschiktheid van dergelijke modellen voor taalgeneratie.', 'de': 'Neuronale Sequenzmodelle sind derzeit die vorherrschende Wahl für Sprachgenerierungsaufgaben. Doch bei Aufgaben auf Wortebene zeigt die genaue Schlussfolgerung dieser Modelle, dass der leere String oft das globale Optimum ist. Frühere Arbeiten haben spekuliert, dass dieses Phänomen auf die Unzulänglichkeit neuronaler Modelle für die Sprachgenerierung zurückzuführen ist. Im Falle der morphologischen Flexion stellen wir jedoch fest, dass der leere String fast nie die wahrscheinlichste Lösung unter dem Modell ist. Außerdem findet gierige Suche oft das globale Optimum. Diese Beobachtungen deuten darauf hin, dass die schlechte Kalibrierung vieler neuronaler Modelle eher auf Eigenschaften einer bestimmten Teilmenge von Aufgaben als auf allgemeine Untauglichkeit solcher Modelle für die Sprachgenerierung zurückzuführen sein kann.', 'hr': 'Modeli neurološke sekvence do sekvence trenutno su glavni izbor za zadatak generacije jezika. Ipak, na zadatkima na razini riječi, točna infekcija ovih modela pokazuje da prazna žica često je globalna optima. Prije su predviđali da je ovaj fenomen rezultat nepravednosti neuralnih modela za generaciju jezika. Međutim, u slučaju morfološke inflekcije, smatramo da prazna žica skoro nikada nije najvjerojatnija rješenje pod modelom. Dalje, pohlepna potraga često nalazi globalni optimum. Te primjećivanje ukazuju na to da loša kalibracija mnogih nervnih modela može izaći iz karakteristika određenog podskupa zadataka umjesto općeg lošeg odgovarajućeg modela za generaciju jezika.', 'id': 'Model urutan-ke-urutan saraf saat ini adalah pilihan utama untuk tugas generasi bahasa. Namun, pada tugas tingkat kata, keputusan tepat dari model ini mengungkap string kosong sering adalah optimum global. Pekerjaan sebelumnya telah spekulasi fenomena ini adalah hasil dari kekurangan model saraf untuk generasi bahasa. Namun, dalam kasus infleksi morfologi, kami menemukan bahwa string kosong hampir tidak pernah solusi paling mungkin di bawah model. Further, greedy search often finds the global optimum.  Perhatian-perhatian ini menunjukkan kalibrasi yang buruk dari banyak model saraf mungkin berasal dari karakteristik dari subset spesifik tugas daripada ketidaksesuaian umum dari model tersebut untuk generasi bahasa.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای ترکیب عصبی به ترکیب در حال حاضر انتخاب بزرگی برای کار\u200cهای تولید زبان است. با این حال، در وظیفه\u200cهای سطح کلمه، دقیقاً تفاوت دقیقا از این مدلها نشان می\u200cدهد که خط خالی اغلب بهترین جهانی است. کارهای پیشینه این پدیده را تخمین کردند که نتیجه ناپایداری مدل عصبی برای نسل زبان است. با این حال، در مورد تأثیر مورفولوژیکی، ما فهمیدیم که ریشه خالی تقریباً هرگز بهترین راه حل زیر مدل نیست. بعدش، جستجوی آسونی اغلب بهترین جهانی را پیدا می\u200cکند. این مشاهده\u200cها پیشنهاد می\u200cدهند که کالیبران فقیر بسیاری از مدل\u200cهای عصبی می\u200cتواند از ویژگی\u200cهایی از یک زیر\u200cبخش\u200cهای کار خاص به جای بدکاری عمومی از چنین مدل\u200cها برای نسل زبان به وجود بیاید.', 'ko': '신경 서열에서 서열 모델까지는 현재 언어 생성 임무의 주요 선택이다.그러나 단어급 작업에서 이러한 모델에 대한 정확한 추측은 빈 문자열이 통상적으로 전역에서 가장 좋다는 것을 나타낸다.이전의 연구에 따르면 이런 현상은 언어가 생성하는 신경모델의 부족으로 인한 것으로 추정된다.그러나 형태가 변화하는 상황에서 우리는 빈 문자열이 거의 모델에서 가장 가능한 것이 아니라는 것을 발견했다.그 밖에 탐욕스러운 검색은 통상적으로 전체 국면에서 가장 좋은 결과를 찾을 수 있다.이러한 관찰 결과에 의하면 많은 신경 모델의 교정 불량은 특정한 임무 서브집합의 특징에서 비롯된 것이지 이런 모델이 언어 생성에 보편적으로 적합하지 않은 데서 비롯된 것이 아니다.', 'sw': 'Mfano wa mfululizo wa msingi wa mfululizo huu kwa sasa ni chaguo muhimu kwa ajili ya kazi za kizazi cha lugha. Hata hivyo, katika kazi za kiwango cha maneno, maambukizi makubwa ya mifano haya yanaonyesha mfumo wa wazi mara nyingi ni maambukizi ya dunia. Kazi za awali zimeangalia hali hii ni matokeo ya kutokuwepo kwa mifano ya ubongo wa kizazi cha lugha. Hata hivyo, katika kesi ya ushawishi wa kimaadilojia, tunagundua kuwa mstari wa wazi hauna ufumbuzi wa uwezekano zaidi chini ya mtindo huo. Zaidi ya hayo, utafutaji wa uchumi mara nyingi hugundua uwezekano wa dunia. Maoni haya yanaonyesha kuwa upigaji mifano maskini ya mifumo mingi ya ubongo unaweza kutokana na sifa za mfumo maalum wa kazi badala ya uvumilivu wa aina hiyo kwa ajili ya kizazi cha lugha.', 'tr': 'Taýdan-täsirli sanlary diller döredilen täzelikleri üçin ön bellenen saýlaw bolýar. Ýöne, söz derejesinde bu nusgalaryň kesikli azalyşynyň boş tizgisini köplenç dünýädäki optimizdir. Öňki işler bu ähmiýeti dil döwletlerine näral nusgalaryň tapylmadygynyň netijesidir. Ýöne, morfolojik etjeginde boş hatyň nusgasy model altynda hiç haçan mümkin däldir. Daha-da, açylyk gözlemek köplenç dünýä optimizi tapýar. Bu gözlerde köp näral modelleriň erbet kalibrasy diller döredişi üçin takyk bir toparyň hasaplanyndan döredilip biler meňzeýär.', 'af': "Nurale volgorde- na- volgorde modele is huidiglik die voordekende keuse vir taal generasie taak. Maar, op woord-vlak-opdragte, die presies inferensie van hierdie modele vertoon die leë string is dikwels die globale optimum. Vorige werke het hierdie fenomen gespesifiseer as 'n resultaat van die ongelukkigheid van neurale modele vir taal generasie. Maar, in die geval van morfologiese infleksie, vind ons dat die leë string is amper nooit die mees waarskynlik oplossing onder die model. Verder, groet soek dikwels vind die globale optime. Hierdie opmerking stel voorstel dat die arme kalibrering van baie neurale modele kan vanaf karakteristieke van 'n spesifieke subartikel van taak staan as algemene slegtigheid van sodanige modele vir taal generasie.", 'sq': 'Neural sequence-to-sequence models are currently the predominant choice for language generation tasks.  Megjithatë, në detyrat e nivelit të fjalëve, përfundimi i saktë i këtyre modeleve zbulon se rreshti bosh është shpesh optimumi global. Punët e mëparshme kanë spekulluar se ky fenomen është rezultat i papërshtatshmërisë së modeleve nervore për gjenerimin e gjuhës. Megjithatë, në rastin e rrjedhjes morfologjike, gjejmë se rrjedha bosh pothuajse kurrë nuk është zgjidhja më e mundshme nën model in. Më tej, kërkimi lakmues shpesh gjen optimumin global. These observations suggest that the poor calibration of many neural models may stem from characteristics of a specific subset of tasks rather than general ill-suitedness of such models for language generation.', 'am': 'የውጤት ምርጫዎች Yet, on word-level tasks, exact inference of these models reveals the empty string is often the global optimum.  የቀድሞው ሥራ ይህንን ነገር ለቋንቋ ትውልድ ጥያቄ የጎደለው ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን በሞሮፎሎጂ ጉዳይ፣ ባዶው ግንኙነት ከሞዴል በታች ምንም ምናልባት ሕግ እንዳይሆን እናገኛለን፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ የጎዳና ምርጫ ብዙ ጊዜ ዓለምአቀማዊ ምርጫን ያገኛል፡፡ እነዚህ አስተያየት የብዙዎች የናውሬት ዓይነቶች ቁጥጥር የሚያስፈልጉት ድህነት ለቋንቋ ትውልድ ትውልድ ላይ ከክፍል የተለየ አካባቢ ስርዓቶችን ከመቆጣጠር ይችላል፡፡', 'az': 'Nöral sequence-to-sequence modelləri halda dil ürəklərinin başqalarını seçir. Lakin, söz-seviyyəti işlərində bu modellərin tamamilə aşağılığı boş dəyişdirilməsi çox zaman küresel optimum olduğunu göstərir. Əvvəlki işlər bu fenomenin dil nəsillərinin neural modellərin inadeqliyinə səbəb olduğunu iddia etdilər. Ancaq, morfolojik infleksiyon vaxtında, boş iplərin modellərin altında ən mümkün çözüm olmadığını görürük. Daha sonra, küresel optimum olaraq dil axtarışı çox zaman tapır. Bu məlumatlar çoxlu nöral modellərin zəif kalibrəsi dil nəsillərinin böyük modellərin çoxluğu təsirlərindən istifadə edə bilər.', 'bs': 'Modeli neurološke sekvence do sekvence trenutno su glavni izbor za zadatak generacije jezika. Ipak, na zadacima na nivou riječi, točna infekcija ovih modela pokazuje da prazna žica često je globalna optima. Prije su predviđali da je ovaj fenomen rezultat neuralnih modela za generaciju jezika. Međutim, u slučaju morfološke inflekcije, smatramo da prazna žica skoro nikada nije najverovatnije rješenje pod modelom. Dalje, pohlepna potraga često pronalazi globalni optimum. Ove primedbe sugeriraju da loša kalibracija mnogih nervnih modela može izaći iz karakteristika određenog podgrupe zadataka umjesto općeg lošeg odgovaranja takvih modela za generaciju jezika.', 'hy': 'Նյարդային հաջորդականության մոդելները ներկայումս լեզվի ստեղծման առաջնային ընտրությունն են: Բայց բառի մակարդակի խնդիրների ժամանակ այս մոդելների ճշգրիտ եզրակացությունը բացահայտում է, որ դատարկ լարերը հաճախ գլոբալ օպտիմալ են: Նախորդ աշխատանքները համոզել են, որ այս երևույթը լեզվի ստեղծման նյարդային մոդելների բավարարության արդյունք է: Այնուամենայնիվ, մորֆոլոգիական ազդեցության դեպքում մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ դատարկ լարերը մոդելի մեջ գրեթե երբեք ամենակարևոր լուծում չեն: Further, greedy search often finds the global optimum.  Այս հետազոտությունները ցույց են տալիս, որ շատ նյարդային մոդելների վատ կալիբրացիան կարող է առաջացնել խնդիրների որոշակի ենթախումբի առանձնահատկություններից, և ոչ թե լեզվի ստեղծման մոդելների ընդհանուր անհամապատասխանությունից:', 'bn': 'বর্তমানে ভাষা প্রজন্মের কাজের জন্য নিউরেল সেকেন্স- থেকে সেকেন্স মডেল হচ্ছে। তবে শব্দ-স্তরের কাজে এই মডেলের সঠিক আক্রান্তি প্রকাশ করে ফাঁকা স্ট্রীনটি প্রায়শ বিশ্বব্যাপী অপারেশন। ভাষা প্রজন্মের জন্য নিউরেল মডেলের অযোগ্যতার ফলে প্রাথমিক কাজ ধারণা করেছে। তবে, মরোফোলিক্যাল প্রভাবের ক্ষেত্রে আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে ফাঁকা স্ট্রীনটি মডেলের নীচে সবচেয়ে সমাধানের সমাধান প্রায় এছাড়াও, লোভের অনুসন্ধান প্রায়শই বিশ্বব্যাপী অপারেশন খুঁজে পায়। এই দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি পরামর্শ প্রদান করে যে অনেক নিউরেল মডেলের দরিদ্র ক্যালিবিবেচনা করা সম্ভবত ভাষার প্রজন্মের জন্য এই ধরনের মডেলের সাধারণ অসস্তার', 'cs': 'Neurální modely sekvence na sekvenci jsou v současné době převládající volbou pro úkoly generování jazyků. Přesto při úlohách na úrovni slov přesný odvoz těchto modelů odhaluje, že prázdný řetězec je často globálním optimálem. Předchozí práce spekulovaly, že tento jev je výsledkem nedostatku neuronových modelů pro generování jazyků. Nicméně v případě morfologické flexe zjišťujeme, že prázdný řetězec není téměř nikdy nejpravděpodobnějším řešením v modelu. Navíc chamtivé hledání často nachází globální optimál. Tato pozorování naznačují, že špatná kalibrace mnoha neuronových modelů může vyplývat spíše z charakteristik konkrétní podskupiny úkolů než z obecné nevhodnosti těchto modelů pro generování jazyků.', 'et': 'Hetkel on peamiseks valikuks keele genereerimise ülesannete jaoks neuroaalsed järjestusest järjestuseni mudelid. Kuid sõnatasemel ülesannete puhul näitab nende mudelite täpne järeldus, et tühi string on sageli globaalne optimaalne. Varasemad tööd on spekuleerinud, et see nähtus on tingitud neuromudelite ebapiisavusest keele genereerimiseks. Siiski leiame morfoloogilise paindlikkuse puhul, et tühi string ei ole peaaegu kunagi mudeli kõige tõenäolisem lahendus. Lisaks leiab ahne otsing sageli globaalse optimaalse. Need tähelepanekud viitavad sellele, et paljude närvimudelite halb kalibreerimine võib tuleneda pigem konkreetse ülesannete alamhulga omadustest kui selliste mudelite üldisest ebasobivusest keele genereerimiseks.', 'ca': "Actualment els models seqüència a seqüència neuronal són l'elecció predominant de les tasques de generació de llenguatges. Yet, on word-level tasks, exact inference of these models reveals the empty string is often the global optimum.  Els treballs anteriors han especulat que aquest fenomen és un resultat de l'inadequació dels models neurals per a la generació de llenguatges. Però en el cas de la inflexió morfològica, trobem que la cadena buida gairebé mai és la solució més probable sota el model. Més endavant, la recerca avadícia sovint troba l'optim global. Aquestes observacions suggereixen que la mala calibració de molts models neuronals pot derivar de característiques d'un subconjunt específic de tasques en lloc d'una malaltia general d'aquests models per a la generació de llenguatges.", 'fi': 'Neuroiden sekvenssimallit ovat tällä hetkellä pääasiallinen valinta kielen tuottamiseen. Kuitenkin sanatason tehtävissä näiden mallien tarkka johtopäätös paljastaa, että tyhjä merkkijono on usein globaali optimaali. Aiempien töiden mukaan tämä ilmiö johtuu neuromallien riittämättömyydestä kielen tuottamiseen. Kuitenkin morfologisen taivutuksen tapauksessa huomaamme, että tyhjä merkkijono ei ole lähes koskaan todennäköisin ratkaisu mallissa. Lisäksi ahne haku löytää usein maailmanlaajuisen optimaalisen. Havainnot viittaavat siihen, että monien hermomallien huono kalibrointi voi johtua tietyn tehtäväryhmän ominaisuuksista eikä yleisesti sopimattomuudesta kielten tuottamiseen.', 'jv': 'sample-points-to-order modells politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Awak dhéwé éntuk sing ngerasakno nggawe barang iki banjuré diolah kuwi model sing nêrung kanggo kalih basa. Nanging, iso disebarke kowe nêmên ngerasakno, kita kedhahé awak dhéwé butilèh basa sing mesthi apik dhéwé nêmên ngerasakno model sing apik dhéwé. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awaraning iki supoyo nggawe kelibyé akeh akeh model sing alam kuwi butine neng alam sing bisa nik sakjane ono karo nggawe bener dhèwèké kesempatan kanggo ngerasaye sak model sing gawe bakal ngelakon akeh jênêr.', 'ha': "@ action: button Babu kuma, a kan aikin maganar-leveli, ana bayyana abun misãlai masu inganci, yana bayyana jumuna mai maras'a da amfani kawai na duniya. Kayan aikin da suka ƙayyade wannan abu yana ƙara matsayin ya kamata wa misãlai na ƙaramin harshe. Haƙĩƙa, ko da ake cikin shawarar morfologi, za mu gane cewa jumla mai maras komai ba ta zama mafi kusa a karɓi raba solar a ƙarƙashin misalin. Furan, search wa fatauci yana sãmu yana da amfani da kiman. Wannan kayan gaskata yana son cewa kalarin miski na misalin misãlai mãsu yawa na neurari, yana iya ƙaranci daga karatun masu bin aikin da aka ƙayyade shi, kuma bã da ruɓa ɓen tsarin wannan misãlai wa zafi-birnin harshe.", 'he': 'דוגמני רצף לרצף נוירואלים הם כרגע הבחירה הכי גדולה עבור משימות יוצר שפות. עם זאת, על משימות רמת מילים, המסקנה מדויקת של הדוגמנים האלה חושפת את השורה הריקה היא לעתים קרובות האופטימום הגלובלי. עבודות קודמות השערו שהתופעה הזאת היא תוצאה של אי-מספיקות של דוגמנים עצביים לדור שפות. בכל אופן, במקרה של השפעה מורפולוגית, אנחנו מוצאים שהשורה הריקה היא כמעט אף פעם הפתרון הכי סביר תחת המודל. חוץ מזה, חיפוש חמדן לעתים קרובות מוצא את האופטימום הגלובלי. העקבות האלה מצביעות על כך שהקליברציה העלובה של המודלים העצביים רבים עשויה להיות תוצאה מאפיינים של תחתונה מסויימת של משימות במקום מתאימות כללית של דוגמנים כאלה לדור שפות.', 'sk': 'Modeli živčnega zaporedja do zaporedja so trenutno prevladujoča izbira za naloge ustvarjanja jezika. Vendar pa pri opravilih na ravni besed natančen sklep teh modelov razkriva, da je prazen niz pogosto globalni optimalni. Predhodna dela so ugibala, da je ta pojav posledica neustreznosti nevronskih modelov za ustvarjanje jezika. Vendar pa v primeru morfološke inflekcije ugotavljamo, da prazen niz skoraj nikoli ni najverjetnejša rešitev pod modelom. Poleg tega pohlepno iskanje pogosto najde globalni optimalen. Ta opažanja kažejo, da slaba kalibracija številnih nevronskih modelov lahko izhaja iz značilnosti določenega podsklopa nalog in ne iz splošne neustreznosti takih modelov za ustvarjanje jezika.', 'bo': 'དབུལ་གྱི་དབྱིབས་sequence-to-sequence་རིམ་དཔེ་གཞི་ནང་དུ་སྐད་རིགས་གསར་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་ལ་གདམ་ཁ་ཚོ་རེད། ཡིན་ནའང་། མིག་སྒྲུང་གི་བྱ་འགུལ་ལས་གཟུགས་རིས་འདི་ཚོ་ཁག་ཅིག་མཐོང་ནི་སྟོང་བ་ཡིན་པའི་ཡིག སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་འགན་ཚོད་ལ་རྣམས་ནང་དུ་བྱུང་བའི་སྣང་ཚུལ་འདིས་སྐད་རིགས་མིའི་དཔེ་གཞུང་གི་ཉེན་རྐྱེན་དང་། ཡིན་ནའང་། གི་སྐོར་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་གནོད་འཚོལ་བའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོའི་ཡིག་རྒྱུན་གྱི་སྟོང་བ དེ་ལས་བརྟེན་ཞིབ་འཚོལ་བཤེར་ན་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་འཛམ་གླིང་ཡོད་ཚད་ཆེ་ཤོས་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པ། མཐོང་སྣང་འདི་དག་གི་དོན་ལྟར་བཤད་ཀྱི་ནུས་པ་དབུལ་གྱི་ཚད་རིམ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་ལས་ཀའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཁག'}
{'en': 'Quantifying Appropriateness of Summarization Data for Curriculum Learning', 'fr': "Quantification de la pertinence des données de synthèse pour l'apprentissage du curriculum", 'ar': 'تحديد مدى ملاءمة بيانات التلخيص لتعلم المناهج', 'pt': 'Quantificando a adequação dos dados de sumarização para o aprendizado do currículo', 'es': 'Cuantificación de la idoneidad de los datos de resumen para el aprendizaje curricular', 'ja': 'カリキュラム学習の要約データの適切性の定量化', 'zh': '量化总数以适性', 'hi': 'पाठ्यक्रम सीखने के लिए सारांश डेटा की उपयुक्तता को परिमाणित करना', 'ru': 'Количественная оценка пригодности обобщающих данных для обучения по учебной программе', 'ga': "Cainníochtú Iomchuí na Sonraí Achoimriúcháin d'Fhoghlaim an Churaclaim", 'ka': 'სწავლის სწავლების კომპანიზაციის მონაცემების მნიშვნელობის მნიშვნელობა', 'el': 'Ποσοτική καταλληλότητα των συνοπτικών δεδομένων για τη μάθηση προγραμμάτων σπουδών', 'hu': 'Az összefoglaló adatok mennyiségi megfelelőségének meghatározása a tanterv tanulásához', 'it': "Quantificazione dell'adeguatezza dei dati di sintesi per l'apprendimento curricolare", 'kk': 'Оқу бағдарламалар оқыту үшін тұжырымдама деректерін шектеу', 'lt': 'Mokymosi programas suvestinių duomenų tinkamumo kiekybiškumas', 'mk': 'Квантификување на соодветноста на податоците за резултат за учењето на училиштата', 'ml': 'പഠിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ചുരുക്കത്തിന്റെ ഡേറ്റായുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'ms': 'Quantifying Appropriateness of Summarization Data for Curriculum Learning', 'mn': 'Сургуулийн хөтөлбөрийн суралцах хэмжээний нийтлэл өгөгдлийн зөвхөн', 'mt': 'Il-kwantifikazzjoni tal-adegwatezza tad-Dejta tas-Sommarju għat-Tagħlim tal-Kurrikulu', 'no': 'Kvantering av tilpassigheten til sammendragsdata for læring av curriculum', 'ro': 'Cuantificarea adecvăratei datelor de sinteză pentru învățarea curriculară', 'pl': 'Kwantyfikowanie adekwatności danych podsumowujących dla uczenia się programów nauczania', 'sr': 'Quantizacija pristojnosti podataka za sažetanje za učenje nastavnog programa', 'si': '喽氞窋喽秽窊喽氞穵喽洁窋喽膏穵 喽夃稖喾權侗喾撪陡 喾冟冻喾勦窂 喾冟陡喾娻洞喾栢痘喾娻东 喽\ue215董喾娻董 喽氞穵鈥嵿痘喾掄逗喾忇董喾娻陡喽氞逗', 'so': 'Qiimeynta ku habboon macluumaadka summarinta ee waxbarashada waxbarashada', 'ta': 'சுருக்கல் கற்றத்திற்கான சுருக்கமான தகவல்களை குறிப்பிடுகிறது', 'sv': 'Kvantifiering av lämplighet av sammanfattningsdata för läroplaner lärande', 'ur': 'curriculum Learning کے لئے جمع کرنا ڈاٹا کی موافقت کی تعداد کرتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phân tích mức độ thích hợp của dữ liệu tóm tắt cho học hành', 'bg': 'Количествено определяне на целесъобразността на обобщените данни за учебната програма', 'nl': 'Kwantificeren van de geschiktheid van samenvattingsgegevens voor curriculum leren', 'da': 'Kvantificering af hensigtsmæssigheden af opsummeringsdata til læseplanelæring', 'hr': 'Quantizacija pristojnosti podataka o sažetivanju za učenje nastavnog programa', 'fa': 'تعداد داده\u200cهای جمع\u200cآوری برای یادگیری برنامه\u200cهای آموزش', 'ko': '양적 과정 학습 총결 데이터의 적절성', 'de': 'Quantifizierung der Eignung von Zusammenfassungsdaten für das Curriculum Learning', 'sw': 'Akipata taarifa za Uhitaji kwa ajili ya Elimu', 'af': 'Kwantifikasie van toepassings van Opsomming Data vir Opsomming Lêer', 'tr': 'Curriculum öwrenmek üçin Toplaýyn Maglumaty', 'sq': 'Përcaktimi i përshtatshmërisë së të dhënave të përmbledhjes për mësimin e mësimeve', 'am': 'የኩነቶች መረጃ', 'bn': 'কার্কুলাম শিক্ষার জন্য সামার্মিকেশন ডাটা উপযুক্ত করা হচ্ছে', 'id': 'Mengukuntifikasi Kecocokan Data Penapisan untuk Belajar Currikulum', 'hy': 'Quantifying Appropriateness of Summarization Data for Curriculum Learning', 'az': 'Q톛rcl톛m톛 칐yr톛nm톛si 칲칞칲n Q톛rcl톛m톛 Veril톛rinin Q톛rcl톛m톛si', 'bs': 'Quantizacija pristojnosti podataka o samuralizaciji za učenje nastavnog programa', 'ca': "Quantificar l'apropiació de les dades de resum per a l'aprenentatge del currículum", 'cs': 'Kvantifikace vhodnosti souhrnných dat pro učení učebních plánů', 'et': 'Kokkuvõtlusandmete kvantifitseerimine õppekavaõppeks', 'fi': 'Yhteenvetotietojen asianmukaisuuden kvantifiointi opetussuunnitelman oppimiseen', 'jv': 'Learn Mode', 'he': 'כיוון התאימות של נתוני סאמריזציה ללימוד תוכניות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Količinska ustreznost povzetkov podatkov za učenje učnega načrta', 'bo': 'Curriculum Learning'}
{'en': 'Much research has reported the training data of summarization models are noisy ; summaries often do not reflect what is written in the source texts. We propose an effective method of curriculum learning to train summarization models from such noisy data. Curriculum learning is used to train sequence-to-sequence models with noisy data. In translation tasks, previous research quantified noise of the training data using two models trained with noisy and clean corpora. Because such corpora do not exist in summarization fields, we propose a model that can quantify noise from a single noisy corpus. We conduct experiments on three summarization models ; one pretrained model and two non-pretrained models, and verify our method improves the performance. Furthermore, we analyze how different curricula affect the performance of pretrained and non-pretrained summarization models. Our result on human evaluation also shows our method improves the performance of summarization models.', 'ar': 'أفادت الكثير من الأبحاث أن بيانات التدريب لنماذج التلخيص صاخبة ؛ غالبًا لا تعكس الملخصات ما هو مكتوب في النصوص الأصلية. نقترح طريقة فعالة لتعلم المناهج لتدريب نماذج التلخيص من هذه البيانات الصاخبة. يستخدم تعلم المناهج لتدريب نماذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل مع البيانات الصاخبة. في مهام الترجمة ، حدد البحث السابق ضجيج بيانات التدريب باستخدام نموذجين مدربين على مجموعة صاخبة ونظيفة. نظرًا لعدم وجود مثل هذه المجموعات في مجالات التلخيص ، فإننا نقترح نموذجًا يمكنه تحديد الضوضاء من مجموعة واحدة صاخبة. نجري تجارب على ثلاثة نماذج تلخيص ؛ نموذج واحد تم اختباره مسبقًا ونموذجان غير مدربين مسبقًا ، وتحقق من أن طريقتنا تعمل على تحسين الأداء. علاوة على ذلك ، نقوم بتحليل كيفية تأثير المناهج المختلفة على أداء نماذج التلخيص سابقة التدريب وغير المدربة. تظهر نتيجتنا في التقييم البشري أيضًا أن طريقتنا تحسن أداء نماذج التلخيص.', 'pt': 'Muitas pesquisas relataram que os dados de treinamento de modelos de sumarização são ruidosos; os resumos muitas vezes não refletem o que está escrito nos textos originais. Propomos um método eficaz de aprendizagem curricular para treinar modelos de sumarização a partir de tais dados ruidosos. O aprendizado de currículo é usado para treinar modelos de sequência a sequência com dados ruidosos. Em tarefas de tradução, pesquisas anteriores quantificaram o ruído dos dados de treinamento usando dois modelos treinados com corpora ruidoso e limpo. Como tais corpora não existem em campos de sumarização, propomos um modelo que possa quantificar o ruído a partir de um único corpus ruidoso. Conduzimos experimentos em três modelos de sumarização; um modelo pré-treinado e dois modelos não pré-treinados e verifique se nosso método melhora o desempenho. Além disso, analisamos como diferentes currículos afetam o desempenho de modelos de sumarização pré-treinados e não pré-treinados. Nosso resultado na avaliação humana também mostra que nosso método melhora o desempenho dos modelos de sumarização.', 'es': 'Muchas investigaciones han informado que los datos de entrenamiento de los modelos de resumen son ruidosos; los resúmenes a menudo no reflejan lo que está escrito en los textos de origen. Proponemos un método eficaz de aprendizaje curricular para entrenar modelos de resumen a partir de datos tan ruidosos. El aprendizaje curricular se utiliza para entrenar modelos secuencia a secuencia con datos ruidosos. En las tareas de traducción, investigaciones anteriores cuantificaron el ruido de los datos de entrenamiento utilizando dos modelos entrenados con cuerpos ruidosos y limpios. Como tales cuerpos no existen en los campos de resumen, proponemos un modelo que puede cuantificar el ruido de un solo corpus ruidoso. Llevamos a cabo experimentos en tres modelos de resumen; un modelo previamente entrenado y dos modelos no entrenados previamente, y verificamos que nuestro método mejora el rendimiento. Además, analizamos cómo los diferentes currículos afectan el rendimiento de los modelos de resumen preentrenados y no preentrenados. Nuestro resultado en la evaluación humana también demuestra que nuestro método mejora el rendimiento de los modelos de resumen.', 'fr': "De nombreuses recherches ont révélé que les données d'entraînement des modèles de synthèse sont bruyantes\xa0; les résumés ne reflètent souvent pas ce qui est écrit dans les textes sources. Nous proposons une méthode efficace d'apprentissage du curriculum pour entraîner des modèles de synthèse à partir de données aussi bruyantes. L'apprentissage du curriculum est utilisé pour entraîner des modèles séquence par séquence avec des données bruyantes. Dans les tâches de traduction, les recherches précédentes ont quantifié le bruit des données d'entraînement à l'aide de deux modèles formés avec des corpus bruités et propres. Comme de tels corpus n'existent pas dans les champs de synthèse, nous proposons un modèle qui peut quantifier le bruit d'un seul corpus bruité. Nous menons des expériences sur trois modèles de synthèse\xa0; un modèle préentraîné et deux modèles non préentraînés, et nous vérifions que notre méthode améliore les performances. En outre, nous analysons la façon dont les différents programmes affectent les performances des modèles de synthèse préformés et non préformés. Notre résultat sur l'évaluation humaine montre également que notre méthode améliore les performances des modèles de synthèse.", 'ja': '多くの研究では、要約モデルのトレーニングデータは騒々しいと報告されている。要約はしばしばソーステキストに書かれている内容を反映していない。このようなうるさいデータから要約モデルを訓練するための効果的なカリキュラム学習方法を提案する。カリキュラム学習は、ノイズの多いデータでシーケンス間のモデルをトレーニングするために使用されます。翻訳タスクでは、以前の研究では、ノイズの多いクリーンなコーパスでトレーニングされた2つのモデルを使用してトレーニングデータのノイズを定量化しました。このようなコーパスは要約フィールドには存在しないため、1つのノイズの多いコーパスからノイズを定量化できるモデルを提案します。3つの要約モデル、1つの事前訓練モデルと2つの非事前訓練モデルの実験を行い、当社の方法がパフォーマンスを向上させることを検証します。さらに、異なるカリキュラムが、事前訓練された要約モデルと事前訓練されていない要約モデルのパフォーマンスにどのように影響するかを分析する。人間による評価の結果は、当社の方法が要約モデルのパフォーマンスを向上させることも示しています。', 'zh': '诸研皆报道总模之数。 摘要常不能见源文本中所作。 立课程学法,以练噪声数。 课程学以训噪声数以序。 凡译事,前治用二嘈净语料库以量化数噪声。 此语料库在总字段中无有,故发一可量化自噪声语料库噪声模样。 三总结模实验。 一预练模二非预,验其能否。 此外,我们分别了课程怎么预练和非预训练总结模样的性能。 我于人工评,我法增汇模。', 'ru': 'Значительная часть исследований показала, что учебные данные обобщающих моделей являются зашумленными; резюме часто не отражают того, что написано в исходных текстах. Мы предлагаем эффективный метод обучения по учебной программе для обучения обобщающим моделям из таких шумных данных. Обучение по учебной программе используется для обучения моделей последовательности к последовательности с шумными данными. В задачах перевода предыдущие исследования количественно оценивали шум обучающих данных, используя две модели, обученные с шумными и чистыми телами. Поскольку такие тела не существуют в областях обобщения, мы предлагаем модель, которая может количественно определить шум от одного шумного тела. Мы проводим эксперименты на трех моделях обобщения; одна предварительно обученная модель и две необученные модели, и проверяем, что наш метод улучшает производительность. Кроме того, мы анализируем, как различные учебные программы влияют на эффективность предварительно подготовленных и необученных моделей обобщения. Наш результат по оценке человека также показывает, что наш метод улучшает производительность моделей обобщения.', 'hi': 'बहुत शोध ने बताया है कि सारांशीकरण मॉडल के प्रशिक्षण डेटा शोर कर रहे हैं; सारांश अक्सर प्रतिबिंबित नहीं करते हैं कि स्रोत ग्रंथों में क्या लिखा गया है। हम इस तरह के शोर डेटा से सारांश मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए पाठ्यक्रम सीखने की एक प्रभावी विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। पाठ्यक्रम सीखने का उपयोग शोर डेटा के साथ अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए किया जाता है। अनुवाद कार्यों में, पिछले शोध ने शोर और स्वच्छ कॉर्पोरेट के साथ प्रशिक्षित दो मॉडलों का उपयोग करके प्रशिक्षण डेटा के शोर को परिमाणित किया। क्योंकि इस तरह के कॉर्पोरेट सारांशीकरण क्षेत्रों में मौजूद नहीं हैं, इसलिए हम एक मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो एक एकल शोर कॉर्पस से शोर को माप सकता है। हम तीन summarization मॉडल पर प्रयोगों का संचालन; एक pretrained मॉडल और दो गैर pretrained मॉडल, और सत्यापित करें कि हमारी विधि प्रदर्शन में सुधार करती है। इसके अलावा, हम विश्लेषण करते हैं कि विभिन्न पाठ्यक्रम पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित और गैर-प्रशिक्षित सारांशीकरण मॉडल के प्रदर्शन को कैसे प्रभावित करते हैं। मानव मूल्यांकन पर हमारे परिणाम से यह भी पता चलता है कि हमारी विधि सारांश मॉडल के प्रदर्शन में सुधार करती है।', 'ga': 'Thuairiscigh go leor taighde go bhfuil sonraí oiliúna na samhlacha achoimrithe callánach; is minic nach léiríonn achoimrí an méid atá scríofa sna buntéacsanna. Molaimid modh éifeachtach foghlama curaclaim chun samhlacha achoimre a oiliúint ó shonraí callánacha dá leithéid. Úsáidtear foghlaim curaclaim chun samhlacha seicheamh-go-seicheamh a oiliúint le sonraí callánacha. I dtascanna aistriúcháin, rinne taighde a rinneadh roimhe seo torann na sonraí oiliúna a chainníochtú trí úsáid a bhaint as dhá mhúnla a bhí oilte le corpóra glan torannach. Toisc nach ann do chorpas den sórt sin i réimsí achoimrithe, molaimid múnla a fhéadfaidh torann ó chorpas amháin torainn a chainníochtú. Déanaimid turgnaimh ar thrí mhúnla achoimre; múnla réamhthraenáilte amháin agus dhá mhúnla neamh-réamhoilte, agus a fhíorú go bhfeabhsaíonn ár modh an fheidhmíocht. Ina theannta sin, déanaimid anailís ar an gcaoi a mbíonn tionchar ag curaclaim éagsúla ar fheidhmíocht samhlacha achoimrithe réamhoilte agus neamh-réamhoilte. Léiríonn ár dtoradh ar mheastóireacht dhaonna freisin go bhfeabhsaíonn ár modh feidhmíocht na samhlacha achoimre.', 'ka': 'ბევრი შესწავლობა მოდელების შესწავლობის მონაცემები უკეთესია. საზოგადოებები ზოგიერთად არ განახლობენ რას, რომელიც ჩავწერა წერტილის ტექსტში. ჩვენ გვეძლევა სწავლების ეფექტიური მეტი, რომელიც ასეთი ძალიან სიმაღლე მონაცემებით გასწავლა სურათების მოდელი. კურსიკულმის სწავლების გამოყენება სიტყვის მოდელების შემწავლობისთვის. სარგულისხმებისთვის წინა კვანტიფიკაციული სუფლიო მონაცემების მონაცემების გამოყენება ორი მოდელის გამოყენება, რომელიც ძალიან და ფრთხილი კორპორაზე რადგან ასეთი კორპორა არ არსებობს საკუნუზაციაციის ფორმებში, ჩვენ გვეძლევა მოდელს, რომელიც შეუძლია კონტაქტირებას ერთი კუნუზაციული კორპუსდან. ჩვენ ვქცევთ ექსპერიმენტები სამი რეზიუმიზაციის მოდელზე; ერთი მოდელი და ორი არ მოდელი, და დარწმუნეთ ჩვენი მეთოდის გამოსახულება. დამატებით, ჩვენ ანალიზებთ თუ როგორ განსხვავებული კურნალიკური კურნალიკური მოდელების გამოსავლენებას და არ განსხვავებული კურნალიზაციის მოდელების გამოსავლენებ ჩვენი შედეგი ადამიანის განსაზღვრებაზე ასევე ჩვენი მეთოდი უფრო მეტადებს სისუბუზაციის მოდელების გამოყენება.', 'hu': 'Sok kutatás szerint az összefoglaló modellek képzési adatai zajosak; Az összefoglalók gyakran nem tükrözik azt, amit a forrásszövegekben írnak. Javasoljuk a tanterv tanulásának hatékony módszerét, hogy ilyen zajos adatokból összefoglaló modelleket képezzen. A tanterv tanulását zajos adatokkal rendelkező szekvenciás modellek képzésére használják. A fordítási feladatok során a korábbi kutatások számszerűsítették az edzési adatok zaját két, zajos és tiszta corporával képzett modell segítségével. Mivel ilyen korpuszok nem léteznek összefoglaló mezőkben, javaslatunk egy olyan modellt, amely számszerűsíteni tudja egyetlen zajos korpuszból származó zajt. Három összefoglaló modellt végzünk kísérleteket; Egy előképzett modell és két nem előképzett modell, és ellenőrizzük, hogy módszerünk javítja a teljesítményt. Továbbá elemezzük, hogy a különböző tantervek hogyan befolyásolják az előképzett és nem előképzett összefoglaló modellek teljesítményét. Az emberi értékeléssel kapcsolatos eredményeink azt is mutatják, hogy módszerünk javítja az összefoglaló modellek teljesítményét.', 'el': 'Πολλές έρευνες έχουν αναφέρει ότι τα δεδομένα κατάρτισης των μοντέλων συνοψίας είναι θορυβώδη. Οι περιλήψεις συχνά δεν αντικατοπτρίζουν τι είναι γραμμένο στα κείμενα προέλευσης. Προτείνουμε μια αποτελεσματική μέθοδο εκμάθησης προγραμμάτων σπουδών για να εκπαιδεύσουμε μοντέλα σύνοψης από τέτοια θορυβώδη δεδομένα. Η εκμάθηση προγραμμάτων σπουδών χρησιμοποιείται για να εκπαιδεύσει μοντέλα ακολουθίας-ακολουθίας με θορυβώδη δεδομένα. Σε μεταφραστικές εργασίες, η προηγούμενη έρευνα ποσοτικοποίησε τον θόρυβο των δεδομένων κατάρτισης χρησιμοποιώντας δύο μοντέλα εκπαιδευμένα με θορυβώδη και καθαρά σώματα. Επειδή τέτοια σώματα δεν υπάρχουν σε πεδία συνοψίας, προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο που μπορεί να ποσοτικοποιήσει το θόρυβο από ένα μόνο θορυβώδες σώμα. Διεξάγουμε πειράματα σε τρία μοντέλα συνοψίας. ένα προσχεδιασμένο μοντέλο και δύο μη προσχεδιασμένα μοντέλα, και επαληθεύστε τη μέθοδο μας βελτιώνει την απόδοση. Επιπλέον, αναλύουμε πώς τα διαφορετικά προγράμματα σπουδών επηρεάζουν την απόδοση των προ-εκπαιδευμένων και μη-προσχεδιασμένων συνοπτικών μοντέλων. Το αποτέλεσμα μας στην ανθρώπινη αξιολόγηση δείχνει επίσης ότι η μέθοδος μας βελτιώνει την απόδοση των μοντέλων συνοψίας.', 'it': "Molte ricerche hanno riportato che i dati di formazione dei modelli di sintesi sono rumorosi; Le sintesi spesso non riflettono ciò che è scritto nei testi di origine. Proponiamo un metodo efficace di apprendimento del curriculum per formare modelli di sintesi da tali dati rumorosi. L'apprendimento del curriculum è utilizzato per formare modelli sequenza-sequenza con dati rumorosi. Nelle attività di traduzione, la ricerca precedente ha quantificato il rumore dei dati di allenamento utilizzando due modelli addestrati con corpi rumorosi e puliti. Poiché tali corpi non esistono nei campi di sintesi, proponiamo un modello in grado di quantificare il rumore da un singolo corpo rumoroso. Conduciamo esperimenti su tre modelli di sintesi; Un modello pretrained e due modelli non pretrained, e verificare che il nostro metodo migliora le prestazioni. Inoltre, analizziamo come diversi curricula influenzano le prestazioni di modelli di sintesi pre-addestrati e non pre-addestrati. Il nostro risultato sulla valutazione umana mostra anche che il nostro metodo migliora le prestazioni dei modelli di sintesi.", 'mk': 'Многу истражувања објавија дека податоците за обука на моделите за резултат се гласни; резултатите честопати не го одразуваат она што е напишано во изворните тексти. Предложуваме ефикасен метод на учење на наставните планови за обука на модели за резултати од такви бучни податоци. Учењето на училиштата се користи за обука на модели од секвенца до секвенца со бучни податоци. Во преведувачките задачи, претходните истражувања квантификуваа бучава на податоците за обука користејќи два модели обучени со бучава и чиста корпора. Бидејќи таквите корпора не постојат во полињата на резултатите, предложуваме модел кој може да ја квантификува бучавата од еден гласен корпус. Правиме експерименти на три модели на резултат; еден претрениран модел и два непретренирани модели, и потврди дека нашиот метод ја подобрува перформансата. Furthermore, we analyze how different curricula affect the performance of pretrained and non-pretrained summarization models.  Our result on human evaluation also shows our method improves the performance of summarization models.', 'lt': 'Daugelis tyrimų parodė, kad apibendrinimo modelių mokymo duomenys yra triukšmingi; santraukos dažnai neatspindi, kas parašyta šaltinio tekstuose. Siūlome veiksmingą mokymosi programų metodą, skirtą apmokyti santraukų modelius iš tokių triukšmingų duomenų. Mokymasis mokymosi programomis naudojamas mokymui iš eilės į eilę modeliams su triukšmingais duomenimis. In translation tasks, previous research quantified noise of the training data using two models trained with noisy and clean corpora.  Kadangi tokių korprų nėra santraukų laukuose, mes siūlome model į, kuris galėtų kiekybiškai įvertinti triukšmą iš vieno triukšmo korpuso. Darome eksperimentus su trimis santraukų modeliais; vienas išankstinio mokymo modelis ir du neišankstinio mokymo modeliai, ir patikrinti mūsų metodą pagerina našumą. Be to, analizuojame, kaip skirtingos mokymo programos daro poveikį ikimokomo ir ikimokomo santraukų modelių rezultatams. Mūsų žmogaus vertinimo rezultatai taip pat rodo, kad mūsų metodas gerina santraukų modelių veiksmingumą.', 'kk': 'Көпшілік зерттеулердің тұжырымдамасын үлгілеу үлгілерінің оқыту деректері дыбыс болып жатқандай хабарлады. көпшілік мәтіндерінде жазылған тұжырымдары көпшілік көрсетпейді. Біз бұл дыбыс деректерінен жазылу үлгілерін оқыту үшін оқыту бағдарламалардың эффективні әдісін ұсынамыз. Бұл бағдарлама оқыту үшін дыбыс деректермен реттеу үлгілерін оқыту үшін қолданылады. Аудару тапсырмаларында, алдыңғы зерттеу деректерінің күнделікті дыбыс пен тазалау корпорасымен оқылған екі модель қолданады. Өйткені бұл корпора тұжырымдамасы өрістерінде жоқ, біз бір дыбыс корпустағы дыбысты есептеуге мүмкін болатын үлгілерді таңдаймыз. Біз үш тәжірибе үшін тәжірибелерді жасаймыз. бір түрлі модель және екі түрлі үлгі жоқ, әдіміздің әдістігін жақсарту үшін тексеріңіз. Қосымша, біз бағдарламалардың әртүрлі бағдарламалардың қанша әсер ететін және қанша әсер ететін жұмыс істеу үлгілерін анализирамыз. Біздің адамдардың оқиғаларының нәтижесіміз сондай-ақ, әдіміздің тұжырымдамдық үлгілерін жақсарту үлгісін көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Banyak kajian telah melaporkan data latihan model pengringkasan adalah bunyi; ringkasan sering tidak mencerminkan apa yang ditulis dalam teks sumber. Kami cadangkan cara yang efektif untuk belajar kurikulum untuk melatih model ringkasan dari data yang bunyi. Pembelajaran kursus digunakan untuk melatih model jujukan-ke-jujukan dengan data bunyi. Dalam tugas terjemahan, kajian sebelumnya mengandungi bunyi kuantifikasi data latihan menggunakan dua model dilatih dengan mayat yang bunyi dan bersih. Kerana corpora tersebut tidak wujud dalam medan ringkasan, kami melamar model yang boleh kuantifikasikan bunyi dari satu mayat bunyi. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada tiga model ringkasan; satu model yang dilatih dan dua model yang tidak dilatih, dan mengesahkan kaedah kita meningkatkan prestasi. Selain itu, kami menganalisis bagaimana kurikulum berbeza mempengaruhi prestasi model penghuraian yang dilatih dan tidak dilatih. Hasil kami pada penilaian manusia juga menunjukkan kaedah kami meningkatkan prestasi model ringkasan.', 'ml': 'ഒരുപാട് ഗവേഷണങ്ങള്\u200d അറിയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകളുടെ പരിശീലന വിവരങ സോര്\u200dസ്സ് ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d എഴുതിയിരിക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി ചിന്തിക്കുന്നില്ല. We propose an effective method of curriculum learning to train summarization models from such noisy data.  ശബ്ദ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് സഞ്ചരിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. പരിഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളില്\u200d, മുമ്പുള്ള പരിശീലനത്തിന്\u200dറെ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ശബ്ദം പരിശീലിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ ശബ്ദം രണ്ട് മോഡ കാരണം ഇങ്ങനെയുള്ള കോര്\u200dപ്പോരാ വേര്\u200dതിരിക്കുന്ന പ്രദേശങ്ങളില്\u200d നിലവിലില്ല, ഒരു ഘോരശബ്ദം കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d നിന്നും ക നമ്മള്\u200d മൂന്ന് ചുരുക്കിക്കാഴ്ചകളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തുന്നു; one pretrained model and two non-pretrained models, and verify our method improves the performance.  അതിനുശേഷം, വ്യത്യസ്ത പദ്ധതി എങ്ങനെയാണ് പ്രഭാവിക്കുന്നതെന്നും പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത വ്യത്യസ്ത പ്രകടനത്തി മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിശ്വാസത്തിന്റെ ഫലം നമ്മുടെ രീതിയിലും നമ്മുടെ ചുരുക്കത്തിന്റെ മോഡലുകളുടെ പ്രകടനത്തിന്', 'mn': 'Ихэнх судалгаанууд жишээлбэлтийн загварын дасгал өгөгдлийн мэдээллийг үнэхээр чимээгүй байдаг. нийтлэл нь эх үүсвэрт бичигдсэн зүйлсийг ихэвчлэн ойлгохгүй. Бид ийм чимээгүй мэдээллээс цуглуулах загваруудыг суралцах хөтөлбөрийн эффективны аргыг суралцах боломжтой. Сургуулийн хөтөлбөр суралцах нь чимээгүй өгөгдлийн дарааллаас дарааллаар дасгал загварыг суралцах хэрэгтэй. Өмнөх судалгааны ажиллагаанд суралцах өгөгдлийн дуу хоёр загварыг ашиглан чимээгүй, цэвэрхэн корпора болон суралцагдсан. Яагаад гэвэл ийм корпора жинхэнэ салбарт байхгүй, бид нэг чимээгүй корпусын дуу чимээгийг тооцоолж чадна загварыг сануулдаг. Бид 3 жинхэнэ загварын туршилтыг хийдэг. нэг арга загвар, хоёр арга загвар биш, бидний арга нь үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулдаг. Мөн бид өөр сургуулийн хөтөлбөр хэрхэн нөлөөлдөг талаар шинжилгээ үзүүлнэ. Бидний хүн төрөлхтний оюутнуудын үр дүнд мөн бидний арга загварын жинхэнэ загварын үр дүнг сайжруулдаг.', 'no': 'Mange forskningar har rapportert at opplæringsdata for sammendragmodeller er støy. samandrag ofte reflekterer ikkje kva som er skriven i kjeldeteksten. Vi foreslår ein effektiv metode for å læra opplæringsprogram for å trena sammendragsmodular frå slike støydata. Læring av programprogrammet blir brukt for å trenja sekvens-til-sekvensmodeller med støydata. I oversettelsesoppgåver er tidlegare forskning kvantifisert støy på opplæringsdata med to modeller trent med støy og rein korpora. Fordi slike korpora finst ikkje i sammendragsfelta, fører vi eit modell som kan kvantifisere støy frå ein enkelt støykorpus. Vi gjer eksperimenter på tre sammendragsmodular. eitt modell som er pretraint og to modeller som ikkje er pretraint, og kontrollere metoden vårt forbetrar utviklinga. I tillegg analyserer vi korleis forskjellige curricular påvirkar utviklinga av område og ikkje-område samanseringsmodular. Resultatet vårt på menneskeevalueringa viser også metoden vårt forbedrar utviklinga av sammendragsmodular.', 'pl': 'Wiele badań pokazało, że dane szkoleniowe modeli podsumowujących są hałaśliwe; Podsumowania często nie odzwierciedlają tego, co jest napisane w tekstach źródłowych. Proponujemy skuteczną metodę uczenia się programów nauczania się, aby szkolić modele podsumowania z tak hałaśliwych danych. Nauka nauczania jest używana do treningu modeli sekwencji do sekwencji z szumownymi danymi. W zadaniach tłumaczeniowych poprzednie badania ilościowo określały hałas danych treningowych za pomocą dwóch modeli trenowanych z głośnymi i czystymi korpusami. Ponieważ takie korpory nie istnieją w polach podsumowujących, proponujemy model, który może ilościowo określić szum z pojedynczego szumu. Przeprowadzamy eksperymenty na trzech modelach podsumowujących; jeden model wstępnie trenowany i dwa modele nietrenowane i weryfikuj naszą metodę poprawia wydajność. Ponadto analizujemy, jak różne programy nauczania wpływają na wydajność wstępnie trenowanych i nietrenowanych modeli podsumowujących. Nasz wynik oceny ludzkiej pokazuje również, że nasza metoda poprawia wydajność modeli podsumowujących.', 'ro': 'Multe cercetări au raportat că datele de formare ale modelelor de sinteză sunt zgomotoase; Rezumatele nu reflectă adesea ceea ce este scris în textele sursă. Propunem o metodă eficientă de învățare curriculară pentru a instrui modele de sinteză din astfel de date zgomotoase. Învățarea curriculumului este folosită pentru a instrui modele secvență-la-secvență cu date zgomotoase. În sarcinile de traducere, cercetările anterioare au cuantificat zgomotul datelor de antrenament folosind două modele instruite cu corpore zgomotoase și curate. Deoarece astfel de corpore nu există în câmpurile de rezumare, propunem un model care poate cuantifica zgomotul dintr-un singur corp zgomotos. Realizăm experimente pe trei modele de sinteză; Un model pre-instruit și două modele non-pre-instruite, și verificați metoda noastră îmbunătățește performanța. Mai mult, analizăm modul în care diferitele programe de învățământ afectează performanța modelelor de sintetizare pre-instruite și non-instruite. Rezultatele noastre privind evaluarea umană arată, de asemenea, că metoda noastră îmbunătățește performanța modelelor de rezumare.', 'sr': 'Mnogo istraživanja je prijavilo da su podaci obuke modela sažetanja bučni; sažetke često ne odražavaju ono što je napisano u izvornim tekstima. Predlažemo efikasnu metodu učenja nastavnog programa da treniramo modele sažetanja iz takvih bukovih podataka. Učenje programa se koristi za obuku modela sekvence do sekvence sa bukovim podacima. U prevodnim zadacima, prethodna istraživanja kvantificirana buka podataka o obuci koristeći dva modela obučenih bukom i čistom korporama. Zato što takva korpora ne postoji u sažetivnim poljima, predlažemo model koji može kvantificirati buku od jednog bučnog korpusa. Vodimo eksperimente na tri modela sažetke; jedan model pretkišenog i dva modela bez pretkišenja, i potvrdite naš metod poboljšava izvođenje. Osim toga, analiziramo kako različite nastavne programe utiču na učinkovitost modela pretkišenih i neodređenih sumiranja. Naš rezultat ljudske procjene takođe pokazuje da naša metoda poboljšava učinkovitost modela sažetanja.', 'so': 'Waxbarasho badan ayaa ka soo sheegay macluumaadka waxbarashada tusaale ahaan lagu soo qoray waa qaylo; Xiriiriyuhu marar badan kuma fikiro waxa ku qoran qoraalka asalka. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa qaab faa’iido ah oo waxbarashada waxbarashada lagu baro qaababka summarinta ah, taasoo ah macluumaadka qaylada ah. Waxbarashada iskuulka waxaa loo isticmaalaa in lagu tababariyo tusaale-qaab-midab-midab lagu tababaro macluumaad cod ah. In translation tasks, previous research quantified noise of the training data using two models trained with noisy and clean corpora.  Maxaa yeelay shirkad caynkaas ah oo aan ku jirin beeraha jimicsiga, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa model aad cod ka qiimeyn karto hal qaylo oo keliya. Waxaynu sameynaa jirrabo ku saabsan saddex tusaale ee summarinta; Mid model ah oo la soo hor dhigay iyo laba model oo aan la falin, iyo in uu xaqiijiyo qaabkeenna uu horumariyo sameynta. Furthermore, waxaynu baaraynaa sida waxbarashada kala duduwan ay saameyn ku yeelan karaan samooyinka soo saarista iyo tusaalaha soo saarista ee aan la arag. Abaalkeena ku saabsan qiimeynta biniaadamka wuxuu sidoo kale ku muujiyaa qaababkayaga inuu horumariyo samooyinka summarinta.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ සංවිධානය විදිහට සංවිධානය විදිහට සංවි සාර්ථාව ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරන්නේ නැහැ මුළු පැත්තට ලියපු දේවල්. අපි ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ඒ වගේ ශබ්ද දත්තෙන් සුරකුණු මෝඩේල් සුරකුණු කරන්න ක්\u200dරික්\u200dරීක්ලුම් ඉගෙන ගන්න භාවිත වෙනවා ශබ්ද දත්ත සමඟ පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න. වාර්ථාව කාර්යාලයෙන්, පසුගිය පරීක්ෂණය සහ පිරිසිදු කොර්පෝරා එක්ක පුහුණු මොඩේල් දෙකක් භාවිතා ක මොකද මේ කොර්පෝරා සම්පූර්ණ ක්\u200dෂේත්රයක් තියෙන්නේ නැහැ, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා මොඩේල් එකක් විශ්වාස කරනව අපි පරීක්ෂණ තුනක් සංවේදනය විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා; එක ප්\u200dරීට්\u200dරේන්ස් මෝඩේල් එකක් සහ ප්\u200dරීට්\u200dරේන්ස් නැති මෝඩේල් දෙකක් තියෙනවා, අපේ විදියට ප්\u200dරවේශනය ව තවත්, අපි විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා වෙනස් විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය මිනිස්සු විශ්ලේෂණයෙන් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විධානය ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සම්පූර්ණයේ ප', 'sv': 'Mycket forskning har rapporterat att utbildningsdata för sammanfattningsmodeller är bullriga; Sammanfattningar återspeglar ofta inte vad som skrivs i källtexterna. Vi föreslår en effektiv metod för läroplaner lärande för att träna sammanfattningsmodeller från sådana bullriga data. Lärande av läroplaner används för att träna sekvens-till-sekvensmodeller med bullriga data. I översättningsuppgifter kvantifierade tidigare forskning buller från träningsdata med hjälp av två modeller utbildade med bullriga och rena kroppar. Eftersom sådana korpus inte finns i sammanfattningsfält föreslår vi en modell som kan kvantifiera ljud från en enda bullrig korpus. Vi genomför experiment på tre sammanfattningsmodeller; en förkränad modell och två icke-förkränade modeller, och verifiera att vår metod förbättrar prestandan. Vidare analyserar vi hur olika läroplaner påverkar prestandan av förkränade och icke-förkränade sammanfattningsmodeller. Vårt resultat på mänsklig utvärdering visar också att vår metod förbättrar prestandan hos sammanfattningsmodeller.', 'ta': 'Much research has reported the training data of summarization models are noisy;  மூல உரைகளில் எழுதப்பட்டது என்ன என்பதை பார்க்கவில்லை. இத்தகைய சப்தமான தகவலிலிருந்து சுருக்கல் மாதிரிகளை பயிற்சி செய்ய ஒரு விளைவான முறையை நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோ தொடர்ச்சியில் இருந்து தொடர்ச்சி மாதிரிகளை பயிற்சி செய்ய பயிற்சியாக பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது. மொழிபெயர்ப்பு செயல்களில், முந்தைய ஆய்வு பயிற்சி தரவின் ஒலிக்குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட இரண்டு மாதிரிகள் சப்தம் மற்றும ஏனென்றால் இத்தகைய நிறுவனம் சுருக்கும் புலங்களில் இல்லை, நாம் ஒரு ஒலிக்கூச்சல் கூட்டத்திலிருந்து குறிப்பிட மாதிரி  மூன்று சுருக்கும் மாதிரிகளில் நாம் சோதனைகளை செய்கிறோம். ஒரு மாதிரியான மாதிரி மற்றும் இரண்டு மாதிரிகள் மற்றும் மாதிரியாத மாதிரிகளை சரிபார் அதற்கு மேலும், நாம் எவ்வாறு வேறு திட்டங்கள் பாதிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது என்பதை ஆராய்ந்து கொள்கிறோம் மற்றும் பார்க்கப்படாத Our result on human evaluation also shows our method improves the performance of summarization models.', 'ur': 'بہت سی تحقیقات گزاری گئی ہے کہ تعلیم نمڈلوں کی آموزش ڈیٹ آواز ہے۔ سراسر پیغام میں لکھی ہوئی چیزوں کو دھوپ نہیں کرتے۔ ہم اس طرح کی آواز دیٹے سے تعلیم سکھانے کے لئے ایک عمدہ طریقہ کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں۔ کریکریکلوم سیکھنے کی استعمال کی جاتی ہے کہ آواز دکھانے کے ساتھ سطح سے آواز دکھانے کی مدل کو ترین کریں۔ ترجمہ کے کاموں میں، پہلے کی تحقیق کی تعلیم ڈیٹا کی آواز کی تعلیم دی گئی دو نمڈل کے استعمال سے آواز اور پاکیزہ کوپرا کے ساتھ آموزش کی گئی ہے. کیونکہ ایسا کرپورا ایک آواز کی جگہ سے آواز کا اندازہ مقرر کر سکتا ہے۔ ہم تین جمع سازی موڈل پر آزمائش کرتے ہیں۔ ایک پرٹرینڈ موڈل اور دو غیر پرٹرینڈ موڈل، اور ہماری طریقہ کی تصدیق کریں کہ عملکرد کو بہتر کرتی ہے. اور اس کے علاوہ ہم تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ کیسے مختلف پرورکیکولوں نے پرٹرین اور غیر پرٹرین کے سامنے نمڈلوں کے عمل پر اثر دیتے ہیں۔ ہمارا نتیجہ انسان کی ارزیابی میں بھی دکھاتا ہے کہ ہمارا طریقہ ذخیره نمڈلوں کے عمدہ کو بہتر کرتا ہے۔', 'mt': "Ħafna riċerka rrappurtat li d-dejta tat-taħriġ tal-mudelli ta’ sommarju hija storbjuża; summaries often do not reflect what is written in the source texts.  Aħna nipproponu metodu effettiv ta' tagħlim kurrikulari biex inħarrġu mudelli ta' sommarju minn dejta storbjuża bħal din. Curriculum learning is used to train sequence-to-sequence models with noisy data.  Fil-kompiti ta’ traduzzjoni, ir-riċerka preċedenti kkwantifikat l-istorbju tad-dejta tat-taħriġ bl-użu ta’ żewġ mudelli mħarrġa b’korpra storbjuża u nadifa. Because such corpora do not exist in summarization fields, we propose a model that can quantify noise from a single noisy corpus.  We conduct experiments on three summarization models;  one pretrained model and two non-pretrained models, and verify our method improves the performance.  Furthermore, we analyze how different curricula affect the performance of pretrained and non-pretrained summarization models.  Ir-riżultat tagħna dwar l-evalwazzjoni umana juri wkoll li l-metodu tagħna jtejjeb il-prestazzjoni tal-mudelli ta’ sommarju.", 'uz': "Ko'pchilik taʼminlovchi modellarning taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlari toʻgʻri holatdir; summaries often do not reflect what is written in the source texts.  Biz bunday tovush maʼlumotdan o'rganish muvaffaqiyatli o'rganish usulidan foydalanamiz. Name Tarjima vazifalarda, birinchi taʼminlovchi taʼminlovchi taʼminlovchi sovur bilan ikkita model yordamida o'rganish va toʻgʻri kompaniya bilan o'rganish mumkin. Chunki shunday kompaniya tahrirlash maydonlarida mavjud emas, biz bitta harflar qo'shilgan tovushni aniqlash mumkin. Biz uchta kichkinaviy modellarda tizimni bajaramiz; biri o'xshash model va ikki qo'llanilmagan modellar, va bizning usulini bajarishni tekshirish mumkin. Ko'rsatganda, biz boshqa maktab o'quvchiga va o'xshagan muhim modellariga qanday qo'llaniladi. Inson qiymatlarimizning natijalarimiz esa o'ylab turish modellarini bajarishimizni ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Rất nhiều nghiên cứu đã báo cáo dữ liệu huấn luyện của mô hình đột xuất rất ồn ào. Bản tóm tắt thường không phản ánh những gì được viết trong các văn bản nguồn. Chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp dạy dỗ tích cực để đào tạo mô hình tổng hợp từ dữ liệu ồn ào như vậy. Chương trình học hành sử dụng để huấn luyện các mô hình lặp lại với dữ liệu ồn ào. Trong các công việc dịch chuyển, nghiên cứu trước đã xác định âm lượng của dữ liệu huấn luyện bằng hai mẫu được đào tạo với đông đúc và khỏe mạnh. Bởi vì có một nhóm người như vậy không tồn tại trong các trường mô phỏng, chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình để đo lượng nhiễu từ một tập đoàn ồn ào. Chúng tôi tiến hành thử nghiệm trên ba mô hình... một mẫu premưa và hai mẫu không phải premưa, và kiểm tra phương pháp của chúng ta cải tiến hiệu suất. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi phân tích các dự án khác nhau tác động đến hiệu suất của các mô hình tóm tắt. Kết quả đánh giá con người cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta cải thiện hiệu quả của mô hình tóm tắt.', 'nl': 'Veel onderzoek heeft gemeld dat de trainingsgegevens van samenvattingsmodellen luidruchtig zijn; samenvattingen geven vaak niet weer wat er in de bronteksten staat geschreven. We stellen een effectieve methode voor curriculum leren voor om samenvattingsmodellen te trainen van dergelijke lawaaierige gegevens. Curriculum learning wordt gebruikt om sequentie-tot-sequentiemodellen te trainen met lawaaierige gegevens. Bij vertaaltaken kwantificeerde vorig onderzoek ruis van de trainingsgegevens met behulp van twee modellen getraind met noise en clean corpora. Omdat dergelijke corpora niet bestaan in samenvattingsvelden, stellen we een model voor dat ruis kan kwantificeren van een enkel noise corpus. We voeren experimenten uit op drie samenvattingsmodellen; Een vooraf getraind model en twee niet-getraind modellen, en verifiëren onze methode verbetert de prestaties. Verder analyseren we hoe verschillende curricula de prestaties van vooraf getrainde en niet-getrainde samenvattingsmodellen beïnvloeden. Ons resultaat op menselijke evaluatie toont ook aan dat onze methode de prestaties van samenvattingsmodellen verbetert.', 'bg': 'Много изследвания показват, че данните от обучението на моделите за обобщаване са шумни; резюметата често не отразяват това, което е написано в изходните текстове. Предлагаме ефективен метод за обучение на учебни програми за обучение на модели за обобщаване от такива шумни данни. Учебната програма се използва за обучение на модели последователност към последователност с шумни данни. При преводачески задачи предишните изследвания количествено определиха шума от данните от обучението, използвайки два модела, обучени с шумни и чисти корпуси. Тъй като такива корпуси не съществуват в полета на обобщаване, предлагаме модел, който може да определи количествено шума от един шумен корпус. Провеждаме експерименти върху три модела за обобщаване; един предварително трениран модел и два не-предварително тренирани модела, и да проверим, че методът ни подобрява производителността. Освен това анализираме как различните учебни програми оказват влияние върху изпълнението на предтренирани и нетренирани модели за обобщаване. Резултатът от оценката на човека показва също, че методът ни подобрява ефективността на моделите за обобщаване.', 'hr': 'Mnogo istraživanja prijavilo je da su podaci o obuci rezimetriranih modela bučni; sažetke često ne odražavaju ono što je napisano u izvornim tekstima. Predlažemo efikasnu metodu učenja nastavnog programa za obuku modela sažetanja iz takvih bukovih podataka. Učenje nastavnog programa se koristi za obuku modela sekvence do sekvence s bukovim podacima. U prijevoznim zadacima, prethodna istraživanja kvantificirana buka podataka o obuci koristeći dva modela obučenih bukom i čistom korporama. Zato što takva tijela ne postoji u sažetačkim poljima, predlažemo model koji može kvantificirati buku od jednog bučnog korpusa. Mi provodimo eksperimente na tri modela sažetke; jedan model pretkišenog i dva modela bez pretkišenja i potvrditi naš metod poboljšava učinkovitost. Nadalje, analiziramo kako različite nastavne programe utječu na učinkovitost modela pretkišnih i neodređenih sumiranja. Naš rezultat u procjeni ljudske procjene također pokazuje da naša metoda poboljšava učinkovitost modela sažetke.', 'de': 'Viele Studien haben berichtet, dass die Trainingsdaten von Zusammenfassungsmodellen laut sind; Zusammenfassungen spiegeln oft nicht das wider, was in den Ausgangstexten geschrieben ist. Wir schlagen eine effektive Methode des Curriculums vor, um Zusammenfassungsmodelle aus solchen verrauschten Daten zu trainieren. Curriculum Learning wird verwendet, um Sequenz-zu-Sequenz Modelle mit verrauschten Daten zu trainieren. In Übersetzungsaufgaben quantifizierten frühere Forschungen das Rauschen der Trainingsdaten anhand von zwei Modellen, die mit lauten und sauberen Korpora trainiert wurden. Da solche Korpora in Zusammenfassungsfeldern nicht existieren, schlagen wir ein Modell vor, das Rauschen aus einem einzelnen Rauschkorpus quantifizieren kann. Wir führen Experimente an drei Zusammenfassungsmodellen durch; Ein vortrainiertes Modell und zwei nicht vortrainierte Modelle, und überprüfen Sie, dass unsere Methode die Leistung verbessert. Des Weiteren analysieren wir, wie sich verschiedene Curricula auf die Leistungsfähigkeit von vorgetrainierten und nicht-trainierten Zusammenfassungsmodellen auswirken. Unsere Ergebnisse zur menschlichen Auswertung zeigen auch, dass unsere Methode die Leistung von Zusammenfassungsmodellen verbessert.', 'da': 'Meget forskning har rapporteret, at uddannelsesdata for opsummeringsmodeller er støjende; Resuméer afspejler ofte ikke, hvad der er skrevet i kildeteksterne. Vi foreslår en effektiv metode til læring af pensum til at træne opsummeringsmodeller ud fra sådanne støjende data. Studielæring bruges til at træne sekvens-til-sekvensmodeller med støjende data. I oversættelsesopgaver kvantificerede tidligere forskning støj fra træningsdata ved hjælp af to modeller trænet med støjende og rene corpora. Da sådanne korpuser ikke findes i opsummeringsfelter, foreslår vi en model, der kan kvantificere støj fra et enkelt støjende korpus. Vi udfører eksperimenter på tre sammenfattende modeller; en forudtrænet model og to ikke-forudtrænede modeller, og verificere vores metode forbedrer ydeevnen. Desuden analyserer vi, hvordan forskellige læseplaner påvirker præstationen af forudtrænede og ikke-forudtrænede opsummeringsmodeller. Vores resultat på menneskelig evaluering viser også, at vores metode forbedrer ydeevnen af opsummeringsmodeller.', 'ko': '대량의 연구에 의하면 요약 모델의 훈련 데이터에 소음이 존재한다.요약은 통상적으로 원문의 내용을 반영할 수 없다.우리는 효과적인 과정 학습 방법을 제시했고 이런 소음 데이터에서 요약 모델을 훈련했다.과정 학습은 소음 데이터가 있는 서열부터 서열 모델까지 훈련하는 데 쓰인다.번역 임무에서 이전의 연구는 두 모델을 사용하여 훈련 데이터의 소음을 양적으로 측정했다. 이 두 모델은 각각 소음과 깨끗한 어료 라이브러리를 사용하여 훈련했다.이러한 자료 라이브러리는 요약 영역에 존재하지 않기 때문에 우리는 하나의 모델을 제시하여 단일 소음 자료 라이브러리에서 오는 소음을 계량화할 수 있다.우리는 세 가지 요약 모델에서 실험을 진행했다.하나의 예비 훈련 모델과 두 개의 비예비 훈련 모델을 가지고 우리의 방법이 성능을 향상시켰음을 검증했다.그 밖에 우리는 서로 다른 과정이 예훈련과 비예훈련 요약 모델의 성능에 어떻게 영향을 미치는지 분석했다.우리의 인류 평가 결과도 우리의 방법이 요약 모델의 성능을 향상시켰다는 것을 보여준다.', 'fa': 'تحقیقات زیادی گزارش داده شده که داده های آموزش مدل\u200cهای جمع\u200cآوری صدا است. جمع\u200cآوری اغلب چیزی که در متن\u200cهای منبع نوشته شده را تفصیل نمی\u200cکند. ما یک روش موثری برای یادگیری برنامه آموزشی برای آموزش مدلهای جمع کردن از این اطلاعات صوتی پیشنهاد می کنیم. آموزش برنامه\u200cهای آموزش برای آموزش مدل\u200cهای ردیابی به ردیابی با داده\u200cهای صوتی استفاده می\u200cشود. در وظیفه\u200cهای ترجمه، تحقیقات قبلی صدای مقداری از داده\u200cهای آموزش را با استفاده از دو مدل آموزش داده شده با شرکت صوتی و پاک. چون چنین شرکت در میدان جمع کردن وجود ندارد، ما یک مدل پیشنهاد می کنیم که می تواند صدا را از یک شرکت صوتی تعداد دهد. ما آزمایش\u200cها را روی سه مدل جمع کردن انجام می\u200cدهیم. یک مدل پیش ریخته شده و دو مدل غیر پیش ریخته شده، و روش ما را ثابت کنید که عملکرد را بهتر می کند. علاوه بر این، ما تحلیل می\u200cکنیم که چگونه برنامه\u200cهای آموزش\u200cهای متفاوتی بر عملکرد مدل\u200cهای جمع\u200cسازی پیش\u200cفرض و غیر پیش\u200cفرض تأثیر می\u200cدهند. نتیجه ما در ارزیابی انسان هم نشان می دهد که روش ما عملکرد مدل جمع کردن را بهتر می کند.', 'tr': 'Köp barlaglar sumatlandyrma nusgalarynyň eğitim maglumatyny gürrüňli bildirdi; Toparjyklar köplenç çeşme metinlerinde ýazylan zady çaklamaýar. Biraz gürrüňli hasaplanjak nusgalaryny şol ses berüginden öwrenmek üçin gurnaly programlaryň täsirli täsirini teklip edýäris. Çaltylyk maglumatlary hatlary daralga hatlary bilen düzenlemek üçin ulanylýar. Terjime eden zadlarynda, öňki araştyrma maglumatynyň 2 nusga gaty we arassa korpora bilen bilinmeli hasaplanýan ses çykdy. Çünkü böyle korpora toplama alanlarda yoktur, bir ses korpusundan sesi çözebilecek bir model öneririz. Üç hulat nusgalarynda experimentler çykýarys; Bir ýalňyş Modeli we iki ýalňyş döwürilmedik modeli we önümizdeki yöntemimizi gowurarak barlaň. Munuň üçin, biz öňki programleriň önüne ýakyn we önüne çykmadyk toparlama nusgalarynyň nähili täsirini çözýäris Adamlar deňleşmegimiziň netijesi hem biziň metodamyzyň sumlaşdyrma nusgalarynyň başarylygyny gowy görkezýär.', 'af': "baie ondersoek het die onderwerp data van opsommingsmodele verkondig is geluid; en Opsomming doen dikwels nie reflekteer wat in die brontekste geskryf is nie. Ons voorstel 'n effektief metode van onderwerp om opsomming modele te tref van sodanige geluid data. Kierskule leer word gebruik om sekwensie-na-sekwensie-modele te tref met geluide data. In vertaling opdragte, die vorige ondersoek het quantifiseer geluid van die onderwerp data gebruik twee modele wat onderwerp is met geluid en skoon korpora. Want sodanige korpora bestaan nie in opsomming velde nie, voorstel ons 'n model wat 'n geluid kan kvantifiseer van 'n enkele geluid korporus. Ons doen eksperimente op drie opsommingsmodele; een voortreënde model en twee nie-voortreënde modele en bevestig ons metode verbeter die prestasie. Ons analyseer ook hoe verskillende program effekteer die presreënde en nie-presreënde opsomming modele. Ons resultaat op die menslike evaluering vertoon ook ons metode verbeter die prestasie van opsommingsmodele.", 'sw': 'Utafiti mwingi umeripoti taarifa za mafunzo ya mifano ya muhtasari ni kelele; muhtasari mara nyingi hautafakari kile kinachoandikwa kwenye maandishi ya chanzo. Tunazipendekeza njia yenye ufanisi wa kujifunza elimu ya kufundisha mifano ya muhtasari kutoka kwenye takwimu kama hizi za kelele. Ufunzi wa ufundi unatumiwa kufundisha mifano ya mfululizo-hadi mfululizo kwa takwimu za sauti. Katika kazi za kutafsiri, utafiti uliopita umepima sauti ya taarifa za mafunzo kwa kutumia mifano miwili iliyomfundishwa kwa kelele na kampuni safi. Kwa sababu kampuni hiyo haipo kwenye maeneo ya muhtasari, tunapendekeza modeli ambayo inaweza kupata kelele kutoka kwenye mashindano ya kelele moja. Tunafanya majaribio katika mifano mitatu ya muhtasari; moja ya mifano iliyoendelea na mifano miwili isiyoeleweka, na kuthibitisha njia yetu inaboresha utendaji. Furthermore, we analyze how different curricula affect the performance of pretrained and non-pretrained summarization models.  Matokeo yetu ya uchunguzi wa binadamu pia inaonyesha njia yetu inaboresha ufanisi wa mifano ya muhtasari.', 'id': 'Banyak penelitian telah melaporkan data pelatihan dari model ringkasan suara; summaries often do not reflect what is written in the source texts.  Kami mengusulkan metode efektif untuk belajar kurikulum untuk melatih model ringkasan dari data yang berisik seperti itu. Pelajaran kursus digunakan untuk melatih model urutan-ke-urutan dengan data yang berisik. Dalam tugas terjemahan, penelitian sebelumnya mencukupi suara data pelatihan menggunakan dua model dilatih dengan suara dan bersih corpora. Karena korpora seperti itu tidak ada di bidang ringkasan, kami mengusulkan sebuah model yang dapat mengurangi suara dari satu korpora yang berisik. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada tiga model ringkasan; one pretrained model and two non-pretrained models, and verify our method improves the performance.  Selain itu, kami menganalisis bagaimana kurikulum berbeda mempengaruhi prestasi dari model ringkasan yang dilatih dan tidak dilatih. Hasil kami pada evaluasi manusia juga menunjukkan metode kami meningkatkan prestasi model ringkasan.', 'am': 'ብዙ ትምህርት የቁጥጥር ዓይነቶች የድምፅ ድምፅ ሲሆን አሰብቷል፡፡ የኩነቶች ዘመን በኩል ጽሑፎች የተጻፈውን አያስተውሉም፡፡ እንደነዚህ የድምፅ ዳታዎችን ለማስተማር የትምህርት ትምህርት ማድረግ የሚቻለውን ልማድ እናዘጋጅታለን፡፡ የመምረጫው ትምህርት የድምፅ ዳታዎችን ለመግለጥ ይጠቀማል፡፡ ትርጉም ማድረግ፣ የቀድሞው ትምህርት የዳታ ድምፅ በሁለተኛ ድምፅ እና ንጹሕ ኮርፖርት የተጠቃሚ እና የተማሩ ሁለት ምሳሌዎችን በመጠቀም ያስተካክላል፡፡ ምክንያቱም እንደዚህ ያለ ኮርፖርት በአጠቃላይ እርሻ ውስጥ የለውም፣ ድምፅን ከአንዲት ድምፅ ኮርፓስ የሚያስተካክል ሞዴል እናስባለን፡፡ በሦስት አነሳቃቂነት ምሳሌ ላይ ፈተናዎችን እናደርጋለን:: አንዱ የተመሳሳይ ምሳሌ እና ሁለት ያልተረጉም ምሳሌዎች እና ልናሳዩን አካባቢ ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የልዩ ትምህርት መምህርት እንዴት እንደሚያካክለው እና እንደተሳሳይ አካባቢ እና የማስተምር ነው፡፡ Our result on human evaluation also shows our method improves the performance of summarization models.', 'hy': 'Շատ հետազոտություններ հայտարարել են, որ համառոտագրման մոդելների ուսումնասիրության տվյալները աղմկոտ են, հաճախ համառոտագրությունները չեն արտացոլում աղբյուր տեքստներում գրված բաները: Մենք առաջարկում ենք ուսումնական ծրագրերի արդյունավետ ուսումնասիրության մեթոդ համառոտագրման մոդելների ուսումնասիրելու նման աղմկոտ տվյալներից: Curriculum learning is used to train sequence-to-sequence models with noisy data.  Թարգմանման խնդիրներում նախորդ հետազոտությունները քանակությամբ գնահատեցին ուսումնասիրության տվյալների աղմուկը, օգտագործելով երկու մոդել, որոնք ուսուցանվել են աղմուկ և մաքուր մարմնով: Քանի որ այսպիսի մարմնի գոյություն չունի համառոտագրման ոլորտներում, մենք առաջարկում ենք մի մոդել, որը կարող է չափել ձայնը մեկ աղմկոտ մարմնից: Մենք փորձեր ենք կատարում երեք համառոտագրման մոդելների վրա, մեկ նախավարժեցված մոդել և երկու ոչ նախավարժեցված մոդել, և ստուգել մեր մեթոդը բարելավում է արդյունքը: Ավելին, մենք վերլուծում ենք, թե ինչպես տարբեր ուսումնական ծրագրերը ազդում են նախկին վարժեցված և ոչ նախկին վարժեցված համառոտագրման մոդելների արտադրողության վրա: Մարդկային գնահատման մեր արդյունքը ցույց է տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը բարելավում է համառոտագրման մոդելների արտադրողությունը:', 'az': 'Çox araştırma təhsil modellərin təhsil məlumatlarını səslə bildirdi. Qısqa mətnlərdə yazıldığını çox dəfə göstərməz. Biz bu səs məlumatlarından qurbanlıq modellərini öyrənmək üçün effektiv bir öyrənmə metodu təklif edirik. Çılgın məlumatları ilə sequence-to-sequence modelləri öyrənmək üçün istifadə edilir. Əvvəlki təhsil işlərində, səs və təmiz korpora təhsil edilən iki modeli ilə təhsil edilən təhsil məlumatının kvantifikativ səsini istifadə edir. Çünki bu korpora toplama sahələrində yoxdur, biz bir səs korpusundan gürültü ölçüsünü hesablayan bir modeli təklif edirik. Biz üç qurğulama modeli üzərində təcrübələr edirik. bir modeli və iki modeli təklif edilməmiş və metodumuzun performansını yaxşılaşdırmasını təsdiqləyin. Daha sonra, biz müxtəlif öyrənmək programlarının əvvəlki və təkrarlanmamış qurbanlıq modellerinin performansını necə etkisini analiz edirik. İnsan değerlendirməsindəki sonuçlarımız də bizim metodumuzun toplama modellərinin performansını daha yaxşı göstərir.', 'bn': 'অনেক গবেষণা রিপোর্ট করেছে সংক্ষেপ মডেলের প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য হচ্ছে শব্দ। সংক্ষেপ প্রায়শই উৎসের টেক্সটে যা লিখেছে তা প্রতিফলিত করে না। আমরা কার্কুলের কার্যকর পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করছি এই ধরনের শব্দ তথ্য থেকে সংক্ষেপের মডেল প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য। কার্কিউলাম শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে আওয়াজ ডাটা দিয়ে সেকেন্স-থেকে সেকেন্স মোডেল প্রশিক্ষণ করার জন্য। অনুবাদের কাজে পূর্ববর্তী গবেষণাগুলো প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্যের কণ্ঠস্বর বিশেষ করে দুই মডেল ব্যবহার করে শব্দ এবং পরিষ্কা কারণ এই কোর্পোরা সার্মিজেশন ক্ষেত্রে অস্তিত্ব নেই, আমরা একটি মডেল প্রস্তাব করেছি যা একটি শব্দের কপাস থেকে কণ্ঠস্বর পরিমাণ করতে  আমরা তিনটি সংক্ষেপ মডেলে পরীক্ষা করি; একটি ভান্ডারের মডেল এবং দুটি অপ্রেমিক মডেল এবং নিশ্চিত করে আমাদের পদ্ধতি প্রদর্শনের উন্নতি প্রদান করে। এছাড়াও, আমরা বিশ্লেষণ করি কিভাবে ভিন্ন কার্চুলা প্রভাবিত হয়েছে প্রেমেন্ট এবং সংক্রান্ত মডেলের প্রভাব ফেলেছে। আমাদের ফলাফল মানুষের মূল্যের ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি সংক্ষিপ্ত মডেলের প্রভাব উন্নত করে।', 'bs': 'Mnogo istraživanja prijavilo je da su podaci o obuci modela sažetanja bučni; i sažetke često ne odražavaju ono što je napisano u izvornim tekstima. Predlažemo efikasnu metodu učenja nastavnog programa za obuku modela sažetanja iz takvih bukovih podataka. Učenje nastavnog programa se koristi za trening modela sekvence do sekvence sa bukovim podacima. U prijevoznim zadacima, prethodna istraživanja kvantificirana buka podataka o obuci koristeći dva modela obučenog bukom i čistom korporama. Zato što takva korpora ne postoji u sumirajućim poljima, predlažemo model koji može kvantificirati buku od jednog bučnog korpusa. Mi vodimo eksperimente na tri modela sažetke; Jedan pretkišni model i dva ne pretkišna modela, i potvrdite naš metod poboljšava izvođenje. Nadalje, analiziramo kako različite nastavne programe utječu na učinkovitost modela pretkišenih i neodređenih sumiranja. Naš rezultat ljudske procjene također pokazuje da naša metoda poboljšava učinkovitost modela sažetke.', 'cs': 'Mnoho výzkumů hlásilo, že výcviková data souhrnných modelů jsou hlučná; Souhrny často neodrážejí to, co je napsáno ve zdrojových textech. Navrhujeme efektivní metodu učení osnov pro trénování souhrnných modelů z těchto hlučných dat. Učení učebních osnov se používá k tréninku modelů sekvence na sekvenci s hlučnými daty. Při překladatelských úkolech byl předchozí výzkum kvantifikován šum tréninkových dat pomocí dvou modelů trénovaných s hlučnými a čistými korpusy. Protože takové korpusy neexistují v souhrnných polích, navrhujeme model, který dokáže kvantifikovat šum z jednoho hlučného korpusu. Provádíme experimenty na třech souhrnných modelech; jeden předtrénovaný model a dva netrénované modely a ověřit, že naše metoda zlepšuje výkon. Dále analyzujeme, jak různé učební programy ovlivňují výkon předtrénovaných a netrénovaných souhrnných modelů. Náš výsledek hodnocení lidí také ukazuje, že naše metoda zlepšuje výkonnost souhrnných modelů.', 'et': 'Paljud uuringud on näidanud, et koolitusandmed kokkuvõtlusmudelite kohta on mürakad; Kokkuvõtted ei kajasta sageli seda, mida on kirjutatud lähtetekstides. Pakume välja tõhusa õppekava õppimise meetodi, et koolitada kokkuvõtlusmudeleid sellistest mürakatest andmetest. Õppekava õppimist kasutatakse mürakate andmetega jada-jada mudelite koolitamiseks. Tõlkeülesannete puhul kvantifitseeriti varasemad uuringud koolitusandmete müra kahe mudeli abil, mis on koolitatud mürakate ja puhaste korpustega. Kuna selliseid korpuseid ei eksisteeri kokkuvõtlusvaldkondades, pakume välja mudeli, mis suudab kvantifitseerida müra ühest mürast korpusest. Me teeme katseid kolme kokkuvõtlusmudeliga; üks eeltreenitud mudel ja kaks eeltreenitud mudelit ning kontrollida, et meie meetod parandab jõudlust. Lisaks analüüsime, kuidas erinevad õppekavad mõjutavad eelkoolitatud ja eelkoolitamata kokkuvõtlusmudelite tulemuslikkust. Meie tulemused inimeste hindamisel näitavad ka, et meie meetod parandab kokkuvõtlusmudelite jõudlust.', 'fi': 'Monet tutkimukset ovat ilmoittaneet, että yhteenvetomallien koulutustiedot ovat meluisia; Tiivistelmät eivät usein heijasta lähdeteksteihin kirjoitettua sisältöä. Ehdotamme tehokasta opetussuunnitelman oppimismenetelmää yhteenvedon mallien kouluttamiseksi meluisasta datasta. Opetussuunnitelman oppimista käytetään sekvenssimallien kouluttamiseen meluisalla datalla. Käännöstehtävissä aikaisemmassa tutkimuksessa kvantifioitiin harjoitusaineiston melua käyttäen kahta meluisalla ja puhtaalla korpusella koulutettua mallia. Koska tällaisia korpusia ei ole olemassa yhteenvedon kentillä, ehdotamme mallia, jolla voidaan kvantifioida melua yhdestä meluisasta korpusesta. Teemme kokeita kolmella yhteenvetomallilla; Yksi esikoulutettu malli ja kaksi esikouluttamatonta mallia, ja varmistamme, että menetelmämme parantaa suorituskykyä. Lisäksi analysoimme, miten eri opetussuunnitelmat vaikuttavat esikoulutettujen ja ei-esikoulutettujen yhteenvetomallien suorituskykyyn. Ihmisarvioinnin tulokset osoittavat myös, että menetelmämme parantaa yhteenvetomallien suorituskykyä.', 'sq': 'Shumë kërkime kanë raportuar se të dhënat e trajnimit të modeleve të përmbledhjes janë zhurmë; përmbledhjet shpesh nuk pasqyrojnë atë që është shkruar në tekstet e burimit. Ne propozojmë një metodë efektive të mësimit të kurikullit për të trajnuar modelet e përmbledhjes nga të dhëna kaq zhurmëshme. Mësimi i kursit përdoret për të trajnuar modele sekuencë-në-sekuencë me të dhëna zhurmuese. Në detyrat e përkthimit, kërkimet e mëparshme kuantifikuan zhurmën e të dhënave të trajnimit duke përdorur dy modele të trajnuar me trupa të zhurmshëm dhe të pastër. Because such corpora do not exist in summarization fields, we propose a model that can quantify noise from a single noisy corpus.  We conduct experiments on three summarization models;  një model i parastërvitur dhe dy modele jo të parastërvitur, dhe verifikojmë se metoda jonë përmirëson performancën. Përveç kësaj, ne analizojmë se si programet e ndryshme ndikojnë në performancën e modeleve të përmbledhjes së parastërvitur dhe jo të parastërvitur. Our result on human evaluation also shows our method improves the performance of summarization models.', 'ca': "Molta recerca ha informat que les dades d'entrenament dels models de resum són ruidosos; els resums sovint no reflecteixen el que està escrit als textos fonts. Proposem un mètode eficaç d'aprenentatge del currículum per formar models de resum a partir de dades tan ruidoses. L'aprenentatge del currículum s'utilitza per entrenar models de seqüència a seqüència amb dades sorolloses. En tasques de traducció, la recerca anterior va quantificar el soroll de les dades d'entrenament utilitzant dos models entrenats amb corpores ruidosos i netes. Because such corpora do not exist in summarization fields, we propose a model that can quantify noise from a single noisy corpus.  Fem experiments en tres models de resum; un model pré-entrenat i dos models no pré-entrenats, i verificar el nostre mètode millora el rendiment. A més, analitzem com diferents programes d'estudi afecten al desempeny de models de resum pré-entrenats i no pré-entrenats. Our result on human evaluation also shows our method improves the performance of summarization models.", 'sk': 'Veliko raziskav je poročalo, da so podatki o usposabljanju modelov povzetka hrupni; Povzetki pogosto ne odražajo tega, kar je zapisano v izvornih besedilih. Predlagamo učinkovito metodo učnega učenja za usposabljanje modelov povzetkov iz takšnih hrupnih podatkov. Učenje učnega načrta se uporablja za usposabljanje modelov zaporedja do zaporedja s hrupnimi podatki. V prevajalskih nalogah so predhodne raziskave kvantificirale hrup podatkov o usposabljanju z uporabo dveh modelov, usposobljenih s hrupnimi in čistimi korpusi. Ker take korpuse ne obstajajo v povzetnih poljih, predlagamo model, ki lahko kvantificira hrup iz enega hrupnega korpusa. Izvajamo eksperimente na treh modelih povzetka; en predtreniran model in dva nepredtrenirana modela ter preveriti, da naša metoda izboljša zmogljivost. Poleg tega analiziramo, kako različni učni načrti vplivajo na uspešnost predtreniranih in nepredtreniranih modelov povzetka. Rezultati ocenjevanja ljudi kažejo tudi, da naša metoda izboljšuje učinkovitost modelov povzetka.', 'ha': "Ana gaya bayan aikin bayani da aka sanar da shirin masana masu ƙararin da za'a yi sauri; Samarari ko da yawa ba su ƙayyade abin da aka rubũta cikin rubutun kwanan. Tune buƙata wani metode mai amfani ga a karanta wa muhimmada daga danne-zane-zane. Ana amfani da amfani da shirin ayuka masu sakan-zuwa-sequence da data na sauti. Daga aikin fassarar, zaman research ya ƙayyade sauti na danne na tsari, ana yi amfani da misalin biyu wanda aka yi wa shirin sauti da tsari. Saboda haka, bangon nan ba ta da shi a cikin wuri na tsohatar, Munã buƙata wani misali wanda zai iya ƙayyade sauri daga wani sauri guda. Munã samun jarrabo a kan misãlai uku; one pretrained model and two non-pretrained models, and verify our method improves the performance.  Furan haka, Munã yi anayya da jinsi karo na dabam'a zafi game da aikin misalin na bakwai da kuma ba'a yi taƙaita ba. Kayyakanmu na ƙari ga muhimmin mutum, yana nũna hanyoyinmu yana ƙara gyaran misãlai na ƙari.", 'jv': 'Menu item to Open \'Search for Open Files\' dialog suming Learn Mode Curric Program Learning Anyone Soalé kabèh karo perusahaan nang resumen anyar, awak dhéwé ngerasah model sing bisa nggawe barang kebudhakan winih Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk karo telu resumen model; lan ayo sampeyan lawangan sampeyan karo model sing ora bisa paketen mrolet, lan nganggep ngerasai sistêm kuwi nggawe barang nggawe gerakan sampeyan. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Ndheke ono mulai nggawe barang manungsa wigatining manungsa punika ingkang njaluk dadi nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan.', 'he': 'מחקרים רבים דיווחו על נתוני האימונים של דוגמני הסיוריזציה הם רעשים; צילומים לעתים קרובות לא משקפים מה שנכתב בטקסטים המקורים. אנו מציעים שיטה יעילה ללמוד תוכנית לימודים כדי לאמן מודלים סאמריזציה ממידע רעש כזה. לימוד תואר משתמש באימון דוגמנים רצף לרצף עם נתונים רעשים. במשימות התרגום, מחקר קודם מכוון רעש של נתוני האימונים באמצעות שני דוגמנים מאומנים עם גופורה רעילה ונקיה. בגלל שקופורה כזאת לא קיימת בשדות הסיוריזציה, אנחנו מציעים מודל שיכול להכין רעש מגופוס רעש אחד. אנו מבצעים ניסויים על שלושה דוגמנים לסיוריזציה; דוגמנית אחת מלפני אימון ושני דוגמניות לא מלפני אימון, ואמת שהשיטה שלנו משפר את ההופעה. בנוסף, אנו מנתחים כיצד תוכניות לימודים שונות משפיעות על ביצועים של מודלים של סאמריזציה מלפני אימונים ולא מלפני אימונים. התוצאה שלנו על הערכה האנושית גם מראה השיטה שלנו משפר את ההופעה של דוגמני המסכם.', 'bo': 'གསལ་བརྟན་བྱས་པར་ཆེན་དག་གིས་མཛོད་ཁང་གི་དབྱེ་རིགས་གནས་ཚུལ་གསལ་བཤད་བྱས་ཡོད། བཅུད་དོན་ཡིག་གེ་ནང་དུ་འབྱུང་ཁུངས་ཡིག་ཚགས་ནང་ཡིག་ཆ་རྣམས་ལ་སྟོན་མེད། འུ་ཅག་གིས་མཐུན་སྣེ་ཚོགས་རྩོམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་བྱེད་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Curriculum learning is used to train sequence-to-sequence models with noisy data. སྔོན་གྱི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་སྒྲུབ་མང་ཙམ་ཅན་གྱི་གཏོང་ཚབ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་བརྡ་སྤྱད་ནས། གང་ལེགས་ཞེ་ན། དབུས་པ་འདི་གནས་ཚུལ་མཛོད་ཁང་གི་ནང་དུ་མ་ཡོད་པ་ལས། འུ་ཅག་གིས་དཔེ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་སྒྲ་ཚིགས་གཅིག ང་ཚོས་མཇུག་བསྡུར་བའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གསུམ་ཀྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཚད་རྩིས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། སྔོན་པ་འཇལ་སའི་མ་དབྱིབས་དང་རྩ་བ་མེད་པའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས། འོན་ཀྱང་། གནད་སྡུད་གཞུང་མ་འདྲ་བ་གིས་དབྱིབས་སྔར་འཕགས་པ་དང་རྩ་མེད་སྔར་སྒྲིག་གི་དཔེ་གཞུང་ལ་བཟོ་བཅུག་པ་ ང་ཚོའི་གྲངས་འབོར་མིའི་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་གྲངས་འབོར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཡང་མཐོང་བ་མངོན་གསལ'}
{'en': 'Civil Rephrases Of Toxic Texts With Self-Supervised Transformers', 'ar': 'إعادة صياغة مدنية للنصوص السامة باستخدام محولات ذاتية الإشراف', 'es': 'Reformulación civil de textos tóxicos con transformadores autosupervisados', 'pt': 'Reformulações civis de textos tóxicos com transformadores autossupervisionados', 'fr': 'Rephrases civiles de textes toxiques avec des transformateurs auto-supervisés', 'ja': '自主監督型変圧器を用いた有毒な文章の市民的再現', 'hi': 'स्व-पर्यवेक्षित ट्रांसफार्मर के साथ विषाक्त ग्रंथों के नागरिक Rephrases', 'zh': '用自控变压器者有毒文本民事改作', 'ru': 'Гражданские перефразы токсичных текстов с самоконтролируемыми трансформаторами', 'ga': 'Athfhrásaí Sibhialta ar Théacsanna Tocsaineacha Le Claochladáin Féinmhaoirsithe', 'ka': 'სამუშაო რეფრაზები ტოქსიკური ტექსტის სამუშაო დააყენებული ტრანფორმეტრებით', 'hu': 'Mérgező szövegek polgári átdolgozása önfelügyeletű transzformátorokkal', 'el': 'Πολιτικές αναδιατυπώσεις τοξικών κειμένων με αυτοεποπτικούς μετασχηματιστές', 'it': 'Riformazioni civili di testi tossici con trasformatori auto-supervisionati', 'kk': 'Өзінің бақылау трансформациясы бар сексикалық мәтіндердің жалпы қайталанулары', 'lt': 'Civiliniai toksinių tekstų su savarankiškai prižiūrimais transformatoriais pakeitimai', 'mk': 'Граѓански рефрази на токсични тексти со самонадгледувани трансформирачи', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Riformi Ċivili ta’ Testi Tossiċi bi Trasformaturi Awto-Sorveljati', 'ml': 'സ്വയം സൂപ്പര്\u200dവ്വപ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ടോക്സിക്ക് പദാവലികളുമായി സിവില്\u200d റിപ്രസസ്സുകള്\u200d', 'mn': 'Өөрийгөө ажиглаж буй шилжүүлэгчидтэй хохиромжтой текстүүдийн иргэний рефразууд', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Cywilne przekształcenia toksycznych tekstów za pomocą samodzielnie nadzorowanych transformatorów', 'ro': 'Reformări civile ale textelor toxice cu transformatoare auto-supravegheate', 'sr': 'Граждански рефрази токсичких текста са самонадзорним трансформаторима', 'so': 'Civil Rephrases of Toxic Texts With Self-Supervised Transformers', 'sv': 'Civila omformuleringar av giftiga texter med självövervakade transformatorer', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'Civil Rephrases Of Toxic Texts With Self-Supervised Transformers', 'ur': 'سئولی ٹکسکس ٹیکسٹ کے بارے میں سئولی ریفرس', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Граждански рефрази на токсични текстове със самоконтролирани трансформатори', 'nl': 'Burgerlijke herschikkingen van giftige teksten met zelftoezicht transformatoren', 'hr': 'Građanske represije toksičnih tekstova sa samoočuvanim transformatorima', 'da': 'Civile omformuleringer af giftige tekster med selvtilsynede transformatorer', 'de': 'Zivile Umformulierungen giftiger Texte mit selbstüberwachten Transformatoren', 'id': 'Rephrase Sifil Teks Toksik Dengan Transformer Dipengawasi Sendiri', 'ko': '자기 감독 변압기를 사용하여 유독 텍스트에 대해 민사 개작을 진행하다', 'fa': 'تغییرات اجتماعی از متن\u200cهای تاکسیکی با تغییرات خودکنترل شده\u200cاند', 'sw': 'Maandishi ya Kiraia ya Teknolojia za Kitoxico na Watafsiri wa kujitegemea', 'tr': 'Öz Gözlemli Taryhçiler bilen Toksik Metinlerin Hatlary', 'af': 'Civile Rephrasies van Toksiese Teks met Selfbeheerde Transformeerders', 'sq': 'Riformimi civil i teksteve toksike me transformues vetë-mbikqyrur', 'az': 'Öz Gözləşdirilmiş Transformatçılar ilə Toksik Metinlərin sivil Rephrasi', 'am': 'የሲቪል Rephrases Of Toxic Texts With Self-Supervised Transformers', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভিস্ট ট্রান্সফর্মার দ্বারা টোক্সিকো টেক্সটের সিভিল প্রতিনিধি', 'hy': 'Տոքսիկ տեքստների քաղաքացիական վերարտադրումները ինքնավերահսկվող վերափոխողներով', 'ca': 'Civil Rephrases Of Toxic Texts With Self-Supervised Transformers', 'cs': 'Občanské přeformulování toxických textů pomocí vlastních transformátorů', 'et': 'Mürgiste tekstide tsiviilümberkujundamine isejärelevalve all olevate transformaatoritega', 'bs': 'Građanske represije toksičkih tekstova sa sami nadziranim transformatorima', 'fi': 'Myrkyllisten tekstien uudelleenmuotoilu itsevalvotuilla muuntajilla', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Ngubah Cino Kemerdekaan Teks Toksi Perangkat Self-Bapak Ngubah', 'sk': 'Civilne preoblikovanje strupenih besedil s samonadzorovanimi transformatorji', 'bo': 'རང་ཉིད་ལྟ་རྟོག་བྱེད་པའི་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་ཆ་མཉམ་དུ་འཕགས་རིས་འགྱུར་བ', 'he': 'שינויים אזרחיים של טקסטים רעילים עם משתנים משגיחים עצמיים'}
{'en': 'Platforms that support online commentary, from social networks to news sites, are increasingly leveraging machine learning to assist their moderation efforts. But this process does not typically provide feedback to the author that would help them contribute according to the community guidelines. This is prohibitively time-consuming for human moderators to do, and computational approaches are still nascent. This work focuses on models that can help suggest rephrasings of toxic comments in a more civil manner. Inspired by recent progress in unpaired sequence-to-sequence tasks, a self-supervised learning model is introduced, called CAE-T5. CAE-T5 employs a pre-trained text-to-text transformer, which is fine tuned with a denoising and cyclic auto-encoder loss. Experimenting with the largest toxicity detection dataset to date (Civil Comments) our model generates sentences that are more fluent and better at preserving the initial content compared to earlier text style transfer systems which we compare with using several scoring systems and human evaluation.', 'ar': 'تستفيد المنصات التي تدعم التعليقات عبر الإنترنت ، من الشبكات الاجتماعية إلى المواقع الإخبارية ، بشكل متزايد من التعلم الآلي لمساعدة جهود الإشراف. لكن هذه العملية لا تقدم عادةً تعليقات إلى المؤلف من شأنها أن تساعده على المساهمة وفقًا لإرشادات المجتمع. هذا الأمر يستغرق وقتًا طويلاً للغاية بالنسبة للمشرفين من البشر ، ولا تزال الأساليب الحسابية وليدة. يركز هذا العمل على النماذج التي يمكن أن تساعد في اقتراح إعادة صياغة التعليقات السامة بطريقة أكثر حضارة. مستوحى من التقدم الأخير في مهام التسلسل إلى التسلسل غير المقترنة ، تم تقديم نموذج تعلم تحت الإشراف الذاتي ، يسمى CAE-T5. يستخدم CAE-T5 محولًا نصيًا إلى نص مدربًا مسبقًا ، والذي تم ضبطه بدقة مع تقليل التشويش وفقدان التشفير التلقائي الدوري. بتجربة أكبر مجموعة بيانات للكشف عن السمية حتى الآن (التعليقات المدنية) ، يولد نموذجنا جملًا أكثر طلاقة وأفضل في الحفاظ على المحتوى الأولي مقارنة بأنظمة نقل نمط النص السابقة التي نقارنها باستخدام العديد من أنظمة التسجيل والتقييم البشري.', 'es': 'Las plataformas que admiten comentarios en línea, desde redes sociales hasta sitios de noticias, aprovechan cada vez más el aprendizaje automático para ayudar en sus esfuerzos de moderación. Sin embargo, este proceso no suele proporcionar comentarios al autor que lo ayuden a contribuir de acuerdo con las pautas de la comunidad. Esto lleva un tiempo prohibitivo para los moderadores humanos, y los enfoques computacionales aún están naciendo. Este trabajo se centra en modelos que pueden ayudar a sugerir la reformulación de comentarios tóxicos de una manera más civilizada. Inspirado por el progreso reciente en tareas de secuencia a secuencia no emparejadas, se introduce un modelo de aprendizaje autosupervisado, llamado CAE-T5. El CAE-T5 emplea un transformador de texto a texto previamente entrenado, que se ajusta con precisión con una pérdida cíclica del codificador automático y de eliminación de ruido. Experimentando con el mayor conjunto de datos de detección de toxicidad hasta la fecha (Comentarios civiles), nuestro modelo genera frases que son más fluidas y que preservan mejor el contenido inicial en comparación con los sistemas de transferencia de estilos de texto anteriores, que comparamos con el uso de varios sistemas de puntuación y evaluación humana.', 'pt': 'Plataformas que suportam comentários online, de redes sociais a sites de notícias, estão aproveitando cada vez mais o aprendizado de máquina para auxiliar seus esforços de moderação. Mas esse processo normalmente não fornece feedback ao autor que o ajude a contribuir de acordo com as diretrizes da comunidade. Isso é proibitivamente demorado para os moderadores humanos fazerem, e as abordagens computacionais ainda são incipientes. Este trabalho se concentra em modelos que podem ajudar a sugerir reformulações de comentários tóxicos de maneira mais civilizada. Inspirado pelo progresso recente em tarefas de sequência a sequência não pareadas, um modelo de aprendizado autossupervisionado é introduzido, chamado CAE-T5. O CAE-T5 emprega um transformador de texto para texto pré-treinado, que é ajustado com uma perda de autoencoder de redução de ruído e cíclica. Experimentando com o maior conjunto de dados de detecção de toxicidade até o momento (Comentários Civis), nosso modelo gera sentenças mais fluentes e melhores na preservação do conteúdo inicial em comparação com os sistemas de transferência de estilo de texto anteriores, que comparamos com o uso de vários sistemas de pontuação e avaliação humana.', 'fr': "Les plateformes qui prennent en charge les commentaires en ligne, des réseaux sociaux aux sites d'actualités, tirent de plus en plus parti de l'apprentissage automatique pour soutenir leurs efforts de modération. Mais ce processus ne fournit généralement pas de commentaires à l'auteur qui l'aiderait à contribuer conformément aux directives de la communauté. Cela prend un temps prohibitif pour les modérateurs humains, et les approches informatiques sont encore naissantes. Ce travail se concentre sur des modèles qui peuvent aider à suggérer des reformulations de commentaires toxiques d'une manière plus civile. Inspiré par les récents progrès réalisés dans les tâches séquentielles non appariées, un modèle d'apprentissage auto-supervisé a été introduit, appelé CAE-T5. Le CAE-T5 utilise un transformateur texte-texte pré-entraîné, qui est réglé avec précision avec un débruitage et une perte de codeur automatique cyclique. En expérimentant le plus grand ensemble de données de détection de toxicité à ce jour (commentaires civils), notre modèle génère des phrases qui sont plus fluides et permettent de mieux préserver le contenu initial par rapport aux systèmes de transfert de style de texte antérieurs que nous comparons avec l'utilisation de plusieurs systèmes de notation et d'évaluation humaine.", 'zh': '赞在线论之台,自社交网络及新闻网站,日益多用机器学以助核事。 然常不反馈于作者,以助社区则。 其于人也,甚耗时,而计犹萌也。 其重可助以更文明为毒论。 受近未配对序进展之启,引入一CAE-T5者自督学模形。 CAE-T5 以豫练之本转换器,转换器噪循环自编码器损益。 试迄今为止大毒检数集(Civil Comments),成句更畅,善存初义,而早期文本传输统则用数评分,与人工评较。', 'hi': 'प्लेटफ़ॉर्म जो ऑनलाइन कमेंट्री का समर्थन करते हैं, सामाजिक नेटवर्क से समाचार साइटों तक, अपने मॉडरेशन प्रयासों की सहायता के लिए मशीन लर्निंग का तेजी से लाभ उठा रहे हैं। लेकिन यह प्रक्रिया आमतौर पर लेखक को प्रतिक्रिया प्रदान नहीं करती है जो उन्हें समुदाय के दिशानिर्देशों के अनुसार योगदान करने में मदद करेगी। यह मानव मध्यस्थों के लिए निषिद्ध रूप से समय लेने वाला है, और कम्प्यूटेशनल दृष्टिकोण अभी भी नवजात हैं। यह काम उन मॉडलों पर केंद्रित है जो अधिक नागरिक तरीके से विषाक्त टिप्पणियों के पुनरावृत्ति का सुझाव देने में मदद कर सकते हैं। अनपेयर्ड अनुक्रम-टू-अनुक्रम कार्यों में हाल की प्रगति से प्रेरित होकर, एक स्व-पर्यवेक्षित सीखने का मॉडल पेश किया जाता है, जिसे सीएई-टी 5 कहा जाता है। CAE-T5 एक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित टेक्स्ट-टू-टेक्स्ट ट्रांसफॉर्मर को नियोजित करता है, जो एक डिनोइज़िंग और चक्रीय ऑटो-एनकोडर हानि के साथ ठीक ट्यून किया गया है। आज तक के सबसे बड़े विषाक्तता का पता लगाने वाले डेटासेट के साथ प्रयोग करना (नागरिक टिप्पणियां) हमारा मॉडल उन वाक्यों को उत्पन्न करता है जो पहले की पाठ शैली हस्तांतरण प्रणालियों की तुलना में प्रारंभिक सामग्री को संरक्षित करने में अधिक धाराप्रवाह और बेहतर होते हैं, जिनकी तुलना हम कई स्कोरिंग सिस्टम और मानव मूल्यांकन का उपयोग करके करते हैं।', 'ja': 'ソーシャルネットワークからニュースサイトまで、オンラインコメンタリーをサポートするプラットフォームは、モデレーションの取り組みを支援するために機械学習を活用することが増えています。 しかし、このプロセスは通常、コミュニティガイドラインに従って貢献するのに役立つフィードバックを投稿者に提供するものではありません。 これは、人間のモデレーターが行うのに非常に時間がかかり、計算アプローチはまだまだ新生しています。 この研究は、有毒なコメントの言い換えをより市民的な方法で示唆するのに役立つモデルに焦点を当てています。 対合していないシーケンス間タスクの最近の進歩に触発されて、CAE - T 5と呼ばれる自主監督学習モデルが導入された。 CAE - T 5は、事前に訓練されたテキストツーテキスト変圧器を採用しており、これは非騒音およびサイクリックオートエンコーダ損失で微調整されています。 これまで最大の毒性検出データセット（シビルコメント）で実験すると、当社のモデルは、いくつかのスコアリングシステムと人間の評価を使用して比較した以前のテキストスタイル転送システムと比較して、より流暢で、初期のコンテンツを保存するのに優れた文章を生成します。', 'ru': 'Платформы, поддерживающие онлайн-комментарии, от социальных сетей до новостных сайтов, все чаще используют машинное обучение для поддержки своих усилий по модерации. Но этот процесс, как правило, не дает обратной связи автору, которая помогла бы ему внести свой вклад в соответствии с рекомендациями сообщества. Это непомерно трудоемко для человеческих модераторов, и вычислительные подходы все еще зарождаются. Эта работа фокусируется на моделях, которые могут помочь предложить перефразирование токсичных комментариев в более цивилизованном порядке. Вдохновленная недавним прогрессом в непарных задачах последовательности, внедряется модель самостоятельного обучения, называемая CAE-T5. CAE-T5 использует предварительно обученный текстовый трансформатор, который точно настроен с шумоподавлением и циклическими потерями автокодировщика. Экспериментируя с самым большим на сегодняшний день набором данных для обнаружения токсичности (гражданские комментарии), наша модель генерирует предложения, которые более свободно и лучше сохраняют исходное содержание по сравнению с более ранними системами переноса стилей текста, которые мы сравниваем с использованием нескольких систем оценки и оценки человека.', 'ga': 'Tá ardáin a thacaíonn le tráchtaireacht ar líne, ó líonraí sóisialta go suíomhanna nuachta, ag baint níos mó úsáide as an meaisínfhoghlaim chun cabhrú lena gcuid iarrachtaí modhnóireachta. Ach ní hiondúil go dtugann an próiseas seo aiseolas don údar a chuideodh leo cur leis de réir threoirlínte an phobail. Tógann modhnóirí daonna go mór é seo a dhéanamh, agus tá cur chuige ríomhaireachtúil fós ag teacht chun cinn. Díríonn an obair seo ar mhúnlaí ar féidir leo cabhrú le hathfhrásaí ar thuairimí tocsaineacha a mholadh ar bhealach níos sibhialta. Arna spreagadh ag dul chun cinn le déanaí i dtascanna seicheamh-go-seicheamh gan péire, tugtar isteach samhail foghlama féin-mhaoirsithe, ar a dtugtar CAE-T5. Fostaíonn CAE-T5 claochladán réamhoilte téacs-go-téacs, atá mionchoigeartaithe le caillteanas uath-ionchódóra denoising agus timthriallach. Ag tástáil leis an tacar sonraí braite tocsaineachta is mó go dtí seo (Tuairimí Sibhialta) gineann ár múnla abairtí atá níos líofa agus níos fearr ag caomhnú an ábhair tosaigh i gcomparáid le córais aistrithe stíl téacs níos luaithe a dhéanaimid i gcomparáid le córais scórála éagsúla agus meastóireacht dhaonna a úsáid.', 'el': 'Οι πλατφόρμες που υποστηρίζουν διαδικτυακά σχόλια, από τα κοινωνικά δίκτυα έως τους ιστότοπους ειδήσεων, αξιοποιούν όλο και περισσότερο τη μηχανική μάθηση για να βοηθήσουν τις προσπάθειές τους μετριασμού. Αλλά αυτή η διαδικασία συνήθως δεν παρέχει ανατροφοδότηση στον συγγραφέα που θα τους βοηθήσει να συνεισφέρουν σύμφωνα με τις οδηγίες της κοινότητας. Αυτό είναι απαγορευτικά χρονοβόρο για τους ανθρώπινους συντονιστές να το κάνουν, και οι υπολογιστικές προσεγγίσεις εξακολουθούν να αναδύονται. Η εργασία αυτή επικεντρώνεται σε μοντέλα που μπορούν να βοηθήσουν να προτείνουν αναδιατυπώσεις τοξικών σχολίων με πιο πολιτικό τρόπο. Εμπνευσμένη από την πρόσφατη πρόοδο στις μη συνδεδεμένες εργασίες αλληλουχίας προς αλληλουχίας, εισάγεται ένα μοντέλο αυτοεποπτικής μάθησης, που ονομάζεται CAE-T5. Το χρησιμοποιεί έναν προ-εκπαιδευμένο μετασχηματιστή κειμένου-κειμένου, ο οποίος είναι συντονισμένος με μια αποκωδικοποίηση και κυκλική απώλεια αυτόματου κωδικοποιητή. Πειραματιζόμενος με το μεγαλύτερο σύνολο δεδομένων ανίχνευσης τοξικότητας μέχρι σήμερα (Πολιτικά σχόλια) το μοντέλο μας παράγει προτάσεις που είναι πιο εύταιρες και καλύτερες στη διατήρηση του αρχικού περιεχομένου σε σύγκριση με παλαιότερα συστήματα μεταφοράς κειμένου, τα οποία συγκρίνουμε με τη χρήση αρκετών συστημάτων βαθμολογίας και ανθρώπινης αξιολόγησης.', 'hu': 'Azok a platformok, amelyek támogatják az online kommentárokat, a közösségi hálózatoktól a híroldalakig, egyre inkább a gépi tanulást használják a moderációs erőfeszítéseik elősegítésére. Ez a folyamat azonban általában nem ad visszajelzést a szerzőnek, amely segítené őket a közösségi irányelvek szerint. Ez az emberi moderátorok számára korlátlanul időigényes, és a számítástechnikai megközelítések még mindig születnek. Ez a munka olyan modellekre összpontosít, amelyek segíthetnek a mérgező megjegyzések újrafogalmazásában civilebb módon. A párosítatlan szekvencia-szekvencia feladatok közelmúltbeli előrehaladására inspirálva bevezetünk egy önfelügyelt tanulási modellt, a CAE-T5-et. A CAE-T5 egy előre képzett szöveg-szöveg transzformátort alkalmaz, amely finomhangolásra kerül a denoising és ciklikus automatikus kódoló veszteséggel. Az eddigi legnagyobb toxicitásérzékelő adatkészlettel (Civil Comments) történő kísérletezés során modellünk olyan mondatokat hoz létre, amelyek folyékonyabbak és jobban megőrzik a kezdeti tartalmat, mint a korábbi szövegstílusátviteli rendszerek, amelyeket több pontszámrendszer és emberi értékelés alkalmazásával hasonlítunk össze.', 'ka': 'პლატორმები, რომლებიც ინტერნეტიური კომენტრიაციას, სოციალური ქსელებიდან ახალგაზომის სახლიდან, უფრო მეტი სისტემის სწავლებას იყენებენ, რომ მაგრამ ეს პროცესი ტიპოლურად არ მოუძლია ავტორისთვის გადახმარება, რომელიც მათ დამახმარება საზოგადოებო მხარდაჭერების მიხედვით. ეს ადამიანის მოდერატორიებისთვის საჭირო დროის შესაძლებლობაა, და კომპუტაციალური შესაძლებლობები უკვე ნაციენტია. ეს სამუშაო მუშაობა მოდელებზე, რომლებიც შეუძლიათ დამხმარება საკუთარი კომენტრებების რეფრაციას. მიმდინარე პროგრესიდან გადაწყვეტილი შემდეგ შემდეგ დასაწყვეტილებაში, სადაც CAE-T5 მოთავსებულია სწავლების მოდელი. CAE- T5 გამოყენებს წინ შესწავლა ტექსტის ტექსტის ტრანფორმაციას, რომელიც საუკეთესო გამოყენება და სიკლიკური ავტოკოდერის გამოსვლა. ჩვენი მოდელი უფრო ფუნქციური და უკეთესი მხოლოდ შემცვალობა ტექსტილის ტრანსტრინსი სისტემისთან, რომელიც ჩვენ შემდგომარებით უფრო ფუნქციური სისტემისთან და ადამიანის განსაზღვრებით.', 'it': "Le piattaforme che supportano i commenti online, dai social network ai siti di notizie, sfruttano sempre più il machine learning per aiutare i loro sforzi di moderazione. Ma questo processo di solito non fornisce feedback all'autore che li aiuterebbe a contribuire secondo le linee guida della comunità. Questo richiede molto tempo per i moderatori umani, e gli approcci computazionali sono ancora alla luce. Questo lavoro si concentra su modelli che possono aiutare a suggerire riformulazioni di commenti tossici in modo più civile. Ispirato dai recenti progressi nelle attività sequenziali non accoppiate, viene introdotto un modello di apprendimento auto-supervisionato, chiamato CAE-T5. CAE-T5 utilizza un trasformatore testo-testo pre-addestrato, che è perfezionato con una perdita di denoising e ciclica auto-encoder. Sperimentando il più grande set di dati di rilevamento della tossicità fino ad oggi (Civil Comments) il nostro modello genera frasi che sono più fluenti e migliori nel preservare il contenuto iniziale rispetto ai precedenti sistemi di trasferimento di stile di testo che confrontiamo con l'utilizzo di diversi sistemi di punteggio e valutazione umana.", 'lt': 'Platformos, remiančios internetinę komentarą, nuo socialinių tinklų iki naujienų svetainių, vis labiau skatina mašinų mokymąsi, kad padėtų mažinti jų pastangas. But this process does not typically provide feedback to the author that would help them contribute according to the community guidelines.  Tai uždraudžiamai užtrukdo žmonių vidutininkams, o skaičiavimo metodai vis dar prasideda. Šiuo darbu daugiausia dėmesio skiriama modeliams, kurie gali padėti siūlyti dar kartą formuluoti toksines pastabas civiliau. Įdiegiamas savarankiškai prižiūrimas mokymosi model is, vadinamas CAE-T5. CAE-T5 naudoja iš anksto apmokytą teksto į teksto transformatorių, kuris yra gerai pritaikytas denozuojančiu ir cikliniu automatinio kodavimo praradimu. Eksperimentuojant su didžiausiu toksiškumo nustatymo duomenų rinkiniu iki šiol (civilinės pastabos), mūsų modelis sukuria nuosprendžius, kurie yra lankstesni ir geresni išsaugodami pradinį turinį, palyginti su ankstesnėmis teksto stiliaus perdavimo sistemomis, kurias palyginame su keliomis vertinimo sistemomis ir žmogaus vertinimu.', 'mk': 'Платформите кои го поддржуваат онлајн коментарот, од социјалните мрежи до новинските веб-страници, сé повеќе користат машинско учење за да им помогнат на нивните напори за модерација. Но, овој процес обично не обезбедува враќање на авторот кој би им помогнал да придонесат во согласност со насоките на заедницата. Ова е забранувачки временски потрошувачки за човечките модератори да го направат, а компјутерските пристапи сé уште се наоѓаат. This work focuses on models that can help suggest rephrasings of toxic comments in a more civil manner.  Инспириран од неодамнешниот напредок во неисправени задачи од секвенца до секвенца, се воведува модел на самонадгледувано учење, наречен CAE-T5. CAE-T5 вработува преобучен текст-текст трансформатор, кој е фино прилагоден со загуба на деноизирање и цикличен автокодер. Експериментирајќи со најголемиот набор на податоци за детекција на токсичност до сега (цивилни коментари), нашиот модел генерира реченици кои се потесни и подобри во зачувувањето на почетната содржина во споредба со претходните системи за трансфер на текст стил кои ги споредуваме со користењето на неколку системи', 'kk': 'Интернеттегі комментарияларды қолдау платформалары, әлемдік желіден жаңалық сайттарға көмектесу үшін машина үйренуді көмектеседі. Бірақ бұл процес қалыпты көмектесетін авторға жауап бермейді. Бұл адамдардың модераторларының жасау үшін уақыт пайдалануы қарамастырып тұрады, және компьютерлік жасауларының әлі қазір қалған. Бұл жұмыс істеу үлгілеріне көмектесе алатын тәртіптердің қайталауын көмектеседі. Жуырдағы жұмыс істеу керек тапсырмаларды бақылау үшін, өзінің бақылау үлгісі CAE-T5 деп аталады. CAE- T5 бағытталған мәтін- мен мәтін түрлендіргішін жұмыс істейді. Бұл аутоматты түрлендіру және цикликалық автокодерді жоғалумен дұрыс түрлендірілген. Қазіргі (Жалпы түсініктемелер) деген ең үлкен токситлық анықтау деректер жиыны тәжірибе үлгісіміз үлгілеріміздің бастапқы мазмұнын сақтау үшін бастапқы мәтін стилінің аудару жүйелеріне салыстырып, бірнеше с', 'ms': 'Platform yang menyokong komentar online, dari rangkaian sosial ke laman berita, semakin menggunakan pembelajaran mesin untuk membantu usaha moderasi mereka. But this process does not typically provide feedback to the author that would help them contribute according to the community guidelines.  Ini menghabiskan masa yang diharamkan bagi pemmoderator manusia untuk melakukan, dan pendekatan perhitungan masih muncul. Kerja ini fokus pada model yang boleh membantu menyarankan semula pengucapan racun dengan cara yang lebih awam. DiInspirasikan oleh kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam tugas jujukan-ke-jujukan yang belum dipaparkan, model belajar yang diawasi sendiri diperkenalkan, dipanggil CAE-T5. CAE-T5 menggunakan pengubah teks-ke-teks yang dilatih dahulu, yang disesuaikan dengan kehilangan pengekod-automatik penolakan dan siklik. Pengujian dengan set data pengesan toksiciti terbesar hingga kini (Comments Civil) model kami menghasilkan kalimat yang lebih mudah dan lebih baik dalam menyimpan kandungan awal dibandingkan dengan sistem pemindahan gaya teks sebelumnya yang kami bandingkan dengan menggunakan beberapa sistem skor dan penilaian manusia.', 'ml': 'ഓണ്\u200dലൈനിലെ കണക്ക് പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമുകള്\u200d, സോഷ്യല്\u200d നെറ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d സൈറ്റുകളിലേക്കും പ്ലാ പക്ഷെ ഈ പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d സാധാരണമായി സമൂഹത്തിന്റെ വഴികാട്ടുകള്\u200d അനുസരിച്ച് അവര്\u200dക്ക് സഹായിക്കാന്\u200d സഹായിക്കുന്ന അധിക This is prohibitively time-consuming for human moderators to do, and computational approaches are still nascent.  ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നത് മോഡലുകളിലേക്ക് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. പ്രശ്നങ്ങളുടെ പുനര്\u200dത്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സൗവകാര് സ്വയം നിരീക്ഷിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ അടുത്തുള്ള പ്രവർത്തനങ്ങളിലൂടെ പ്രവേശിപ്പിച്ചു CAE-T5 മുമ്പ് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് മാറ്റുന്ന പദാവലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും സൈക്കിളിക്ക് സ്വയം കോഡെര്\u200d നഷ്ടപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനും മ നാളുവരെ ഏറ്റവും വലിയ വ്യാസ്ത്രീതി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്ന ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റുകളുമായി പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമു', 'mt': 'Pjattaformi li jappoġġjaw il-kummentarju onlajn, minn netwerks soċjali sa siti tal-aħbarijiet, qegħdin dejjem aktar iħeġġu t-tagħlim tal-magni biex jgħinu l-isforzi tagħhom ta’ moderazzjoni. Iżda dan il-proċess tipikament ma jipprovdix rispons lill-awtur li jgħinhom jikkontribwixxu skont il-linji gwida tal-komunità. Dan jieħu ħafna żmien biex jagħmlu l-moderaturi umani, u l-approċċi komputattivi għadhom qed jinħolqu. Dan ix-xogħol jiffoka fuq mudelli li jistgħu jgħinu jissuġġerixxu riformulazzjonijiet ta’ kummenti tossiċi b’mod aktar ċivili. Inspired by recent progress in unpaired sequence-to-sequence tasks, a self-supervised learning model is introduced, called CAE-T5.  CAE-T5 jimpjega trasformatur tat-test għal test imħarreġ minn qabel, li huwa rfinut b’telf ta’ denoising u awto-kodifikatur ċikliku. L-esperimentazzjoni bl-akbar sett ta’ dejta dwar l-individwazzjoni tat-tossiċità sal-lum (Kummenti Ċivili) il-mudell tagħna jiġġenera sentenzi li huma aktar fluwenti u aħjar fil-preservazzjoni tal-kontenut inizjali meta mqabbel ma’ sistemi ta’ trasferiment tal-istil tat-test preċedenti li tqabblu mal-użu ta’ diversi sistemi ta’ punteġġ u evalwazzjoni umana.', 'pl': 'Platformy obsługujące komentarze online, od sieci społecznościowych po strony informacyjne, coraz częściej wykorzystują uczenie maszynowe, aby wspomóc ich działania w moderacji. Jednak proces ten zazwyczaj nie dostarcza autorowi informacji zwrotnych, które pomogłyby mu wnieść wkład zgodnie z wytycznymi społeczności. Jest to niezbyt czasochłonne dla ludzkich moderatorów, a podejścia obliczeniowe wciąż powstają. Praca koncentruje się na modelach, które mogą pomóc sugerować przeformułowania toksycznych komentarzy w sposób bardziej cywilny. Zainspirowany ostatnimi postępami w nieparowanych zadaniach sekwencji do sekwencji, wprowadzany został model samodzielnego uczenia się o nazwie CAE-T5. CAE-T5 wykorzystuje wstępnie przeszkolony transformator tekstowo-tekstowy, który jest dostrojony za pomocą zniszczenia i cyklicznej straty autokodera. Eksperymentując z największym dotychczasowym zbiorem danych dotyczących wykrywania toksyczności (komentarze cywilne) nasz model generuje zdania, które są bardziej płynne i lepiej w zachowaniu początkowej treści w porównaniu z wcześniejszymi systemami transferu stylu tekstu, które porównujemy z wykorzystaniem kilku systemów punktowania i oceny ludzkiej.', 'ro': 'Platformele care sprijină comentariile online, de la rețelele sociale la site-urile de știri, utilizează din ce în ce mai mult învățarea automată pentru a sprijini eforturile lor de moderare. Dar acest proces nu oferă, de obicei, feedback autorului care să-i ajute să contribuie în conformitate cu orientările comunității. Acest lucru este prohibitiv consumator de timp pentru moderatorii umani să facă, iar abordările computaționale sunt încă la naștere. Această lucrare se concentrează pe modele care pot ajuta să sugereze reformularea comentariilor toxice într-un mod mai civil. Inspirat de progresele recente în sarcinile secvență-la-secvență fără pereche, este introdus un model de învățare auto-supravegheat, numit CAE-T5. CAE-T5 utilizează un transformator text-text pre-instruit, care este reglat fin cu o pierdere de denoising și ciclic auto-encoder. Experimentând cu cel mai mare set de date de detectare a toxicității de până în prezent (Comentarii Civile), modelul nostru generează propoziții care sunt mai fluente și mai bune în păstrarea conținutului inițial în comparație cu sistemele anterioare de transfer de stil text, pe care le comparăm cu utilizarea mai multor sisteme de scoring și evaluare umană.', 'mn': 'Интернет сэтгүүлчийг дэмжиж буй платформууд, нийгмийн сүлжээс мэдээллийн сайт хүртэл машин суралцах үйл ажиллагаанд тусалдаг. Гэхдээ энэ үйл явц ерөнхийдөө нийгмийн удирдлагаа дамжуулахад тусалдаг зохиолчдыг хариу өгдөггүй. Энэ нь хүн төрөлхтний орчин үеийн хугацааны хэрэглээнд зориулагддаг. Хэрвээ тооцоололтын арга баримтууд ч үгүй. Энэ ажил нь илүү иргэний төлөвлөгөө дахин хохиромжтой сэтгэл зүйлсийг дахин сэргээх боломжтой загварууд дээр төвлөрүүлдэг. Сүүлийн үеийн дасгал хөгжлийн дасгал хөгжлийн дасгал хөгжлийн дасгал, өөрийгөө удирдах суралцах загвар, CAE-T5 гэдэг. CAE-T5 нь урд сургалтын текст болон текст шилжүүлэгч ашигладаг. Энэ нь хуваагдах, циклик автокодлогч алдагдах боломжтой. Өнөөдрийн хамгийн том toxicity detection өгөгдлийн санг (Civil Comments) туршилтаар бидний загвар нь хэдэн сүлжээний систем болон хүн төрөлхтний үнэлгээгээр харьцуулахад илүү шингэн, илүү сайхан өгөгдлийг бий болгодог.', 'no': 'Plattformar som støttar kommentarar på nettverk, frå sosiale nettverk til nye nettverk, er større å levera maskinelæring for å hjelpa dei modereringsforsøka. Men denne prosessen gjev ikkje vanlegvis tilbakemeldingar til forfatteren som vil hjelpa dei til å bidra med i tillegg til fellesskapsrettene. Dette er forhindra tidspunkt for menneske moderatorar å gjera, og datatilnærmingar er fortsatt nascent. Dette arbeidet fokuserer på modeller som kan hjelpa å foreslå gjenoppretting av toksiske kommentarar på meir sivile måte. Inspirert av nyleg framdring i utforma sekvens-til-sekvens-oppgåver, vert introdusert ein sjølvoversikt læringsmodell, kalla CAE-T5. CAE-T5 arbeider ein fortreng teksttransformasjon til tekst, som er fint oppsett med ein beløving og syklisk autokoding tap. Eksperimentert med den største datasettet for toksiktivitetoppdaging til dag (Civilkommentarar) modellen vårt lager setningar som er meir flukt og bedre ved å lagra opphavslinjeinnhaldet i sammenligning med tidlegare tekststiloverføringssystemer som vi sammenlignar med fleire forskjellingssystemar og menneskelige evaluering.', 'so': "Jardiinooyinka kaalmeeya commentarka shabakadda, shabakadda bulshada iyo bogagga warbixinta, waxay u sii korodhsan yihiin wax barashada machine si ay u caawiyaan hawshooda cusub. Laakiin baaritaanku sida caadiga ah uma bixiyo warcelin qofka qoraalka ka caawinaya inay ku qeybqaadaan si waafaqsan hagitaanka bulshada. Tani waa isticmaalka waqtiga qasabka ah ee la isticmaali karo qofka dhaqdhaqaaqa ah, waana habbooyinka xisaabtu weli ay xunxun yihiin. Shaqodanku wuxuu ku kalsoonyahay tusaalooyin, kaas oo caawinaya in lagu soo bandhigi karo aragtida maandooriyaha si mukhaadaraad ah. Waxyaabaha la soo dhiibay ee ugu dambeeyay shaqooyin aan labada xilli lagu sameeyo, waxaa la soo bandhigay model waxbarasho oo la ilaaliyo oo la yidhaahdo CAE-T5. CAE-T5 employs a pre-trained text-to-text transformer, which is fine tuned with a denoising and cyclic auto-encoder loss.  Imtixaanka macluumaadka ugu weyn ee baaritaanka toksiska (Civil Comments) ayaa sameynaya hadallo ka sii faa'iido badan oo ka wanaagsan in lagu ilaaliyo kooxda ugu horeeyay oo la barbarbaranayo nidaamka qaabka beddelinta ee qoraalka ee hore oo aynu isbarbarbardhigno isticmaalka nidaamka kooxaha iyo qiimeynta biniaadamka.", 'sv': 'Plattformar som stöder onlinekommentarer, från sociala nätverk till nyhetssajter, utnyttjar alltmer maskininlärning för att underlätta deras modereringsinsatser. Men denna process ger vanligtvis inte feedback till författaren som skulle hjälpa dem att bidra enligt gemenskapens riktlinjer. Detta är orimligt tidskrävande för mänskliga moderatorer att göra, och beräkningsmetoder är fortfarande på väg. Detta arbete fokuserar på modeller som kan bidra till att föreslå omformuleringar av giftiga kommentarer på ett mer civilt sätt. Inspirerad av den senaste tidens framsteg i oparredda sekvens-till-sekvensuppgifter introduceras en självövervakad inlärningsmodell, kallad CAE-T5. CAE-T5 använder en färdigutbildad text-till-text transformator, som är finjusterad med en denoising och cyklisk autokodningsförlust. Genom att experimentera med den största datauppsättningen för toxicitetsdetektering hittills (Civil Comments) genererar vår modell meningar som är mer flytande och bättre på att bevara det ursprungliga innehållet jämfört med tidigare system för textformatöverföring som vi jämför med att använda flera poängsystem och mänsklig utvärdering.', 'sr': 'Platforme koje podržavaju komentar na internetu, od socijalnih mreža do novinskih sajtova, sve više utiču na učenje mašine da pomognu njihovim moderacijskim naporima. Ali ovaj proces obično ne pruža reakciju autoru koji bi im pomogao da doprinesu u skladu sa uputstvima zajednice. Ovo je zabranjivo potrošenje vremena za ljudske moderatore, a računalni pristupi su i dalje nascent. Ovaj rad se fokusira na modele koji mogu pomoći predložiti represiranje toksičnih komentara na više građanskog naèin a. Inspiran nedavnim napretkom u neopravljenim zadacima sekvence do sekvence, uvede se model za samoopraćenje učenja, zove se CAE-T5. CAE-T5 upotrebljava predobučeni transformator teksta na tekst, koji je u redu prilagođen gubitkom indiciranja i cikličkog autokodera. Eksperimentovanje sa najvećim datom za detekciju toksičnosti do sada (civilni komentari) naš model stvara rečenice koje su tečnije i bolje u saèuvanju početnog sadržaja u usporedbi sa ranijim sistemima prebacivanja teksta stila koji uspoređujemo s korištenjem nekoliko sistema skoringa i ljudske procjene.', 'si': 'සාමාජික ජාතික ජාතිකයෙන් ආරක්ෂා කරන්න ප්ලැටෆෝර්ම් වලින් අන්තර්ජාතිකය සහය වෙන්නේ ඔවුන්ගේ අධ ඒත් මේ පරීක්ෂණය සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම ලේඛකට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් දෙන්නේ නෑ ඒකෙන් ඔවුන්ට සමාජ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් අන මේක තමයි මිනිස්සු මධ්\u200dයස්ථානයට කරන්න වෙලාවක් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාර කරනවා, සහ පරිගණනය විදිහට තාමත්  මේ වැඩේ ප්\u200dරධාන විදිහට පුළුවන් මොඩේල් වලට ප්\u200dරධාන වෙන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ කිරීමක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරධ අලුත් වැඩියෙන් ප්\u200dරභාවිත විදිහට පරිස්සම් විදිහට පරිස්සම් කරනවා, ස්වයංග්\u200dරහණ විදිහට පරිස්සම් කරලා ඉගෙනීම CAE- T5 ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණිත පාළුවෙන් පාළුවෙන් පරිවර්තනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒක හොඳයි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ සායික්ලික් ස්වයං පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ලොකු විශාල විශාල පරීක්ෂණ දත්ත සෙට් වෙනුවෙන් (සිවිල් කොටස්) අපේ මොඩේල් විශාල විශාල විශේෂය සහ හ හොඳයි ප්\u200dරධාන විශේෂය ස', 'ta': 'இணைய குறிப்புரையை ஆதரிக்கும் திட்டங்கள், சமூக வலைப்பின்னல்களிலிருந்து செய்திகள் தளங்களில் இருந்து செய்திகள் தளங்கள், அவர் ஆனால் இந்த செயல்பாடு வழங்கப்படவில்லை அது சமூகத்தின் வழிகாட்டிகளை பொருத்தி அவர்களுக்கு உதவும் ஆசிரியருக்கு பதில் ச இது மனிதர்களுக்கான நேரம் செயல்படுத்தல் தடுக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, மற்றும் கணக்கீட்டு வழிகள் இன்னும் மோசமாக இருக்கிறது. இந்த வேலை மாதிரிகளின் மீது கவனம் செலுத்துகிறது அது தொலைநிலையான குறிப்புகளை திரும்பச் செய்ய முடியும். தற்போதைய முன்னேற்றத்தால் தொடர்ந்து வரிசையில் உள்ள செயல்பாடுகளால் inspired by inspiration by inspiring a self-watched learning model, called CAE-T5. CAE- T5 முன்பயிற்சி உரையில் இருந்து உரை மாற்றியமைப்பை பயன்படுத்துகிறது, அது டென்யோசிங் மற்றும் சைக்ளிக் தானாகவே குறியீட்டு இழ பெரிய புவியியல் கண்டுபிடிப்பு தகவல் அமைப்புடன் பரிசோதிக்கும் போது எங்கள் மாதிரி வாக்கியங்களை உருவாக்குகிறது அது மிகவும் தெளிவான மற்றும் முந்தைய உரை பாணி மாற்றும', 'ur': 'پولاٹفرم جو آنلاین کی کمٹریری کی مدد کرتی ہیں، سوسیل نیٹورک سے نیویس سائٹوں تک، ان کی مدرسی کی تلاش کی مدد کرنے کے لئے ماشین کی تعلیم کو اضافہ کر رہے ہیں۔ لیکن یہ پروسس معمولاً لکھنے والوں کے لئے فیڈ واپس نہیں دیتا جو ان کی مدد کریں گے کہ ان کی اجتماعی راہ دکھانے کے مطابق ان کی مدد کریں۔ یہ لوگوں کی مدرست کرنے والوں کے لئے وقت مصرف کرنا حرام ہے، اور کامپیوتر کی تقریبیں ابھی بھی ناپسند ہیں. یہ کام مدلکوں پر تمرکز کرتا ہے جن کی مدد کرسکتی ہے کہ زیادہ سیاسی طریقے سے جسم کی توضیح کو دوبارہ دفع کرسکتے ہیں. اچھی پیشرفت کے ذریعے غیرپرداختہ سفارشی کے کاموں میں اپنا تحقیر کیا گیا ہے، ایک خود تحقیر کی تعلیم مدل، CAE-T5 کا نام ہے. CAE-T5 ایک پیش آموزش کی پیغام پر مترجم کرنے والے کو استعمال کرتا ہے، جسے ایک نمایش اور سیکلیک اتوٹ انکوڈر خسارہ کے ساتھ اچھی طرح تنظیم کیا جاتا ہے. ہمارے مدل سے بہت بڑی جسمی ڈیٹ سٹ کے ساتھ تجربہ کرتا ہے جو پہلی ٹیکسٹ سٹیل ترنسیٹ سیستم کے مقابلہ میں بہت سی سیستم اور انسان کی ارزیابی کے مطابق مقابلہ میں آغاز منصوبت کی حفاظت کرنے کے لئے بہتر اور بہترین جماعتیں پیدا کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': 'Name But this process does not typically provide feedback to the author that would help them contribute according to the community guidelines.  Bu odamlar uchun hech qanday vaqt foydalanishi harakat. Bu kompyuterlar ham ishlashi mumkin. Bu ishni boshqa shaxsiy ifodalarni takrorlash uchun foydalanuvchi modellarga foydalanadi. Name Name Biz modelimiz bir necha qiymatlar tizimi va inson qiymatlari bilan bir necha qiymatlar tizim va qiymati bilan birlashtirilgan birinchi matn uslub tarkibini saqlash imkoniyatini yaratadi.', 'vi': 'Những chương trình hỗ trợ tường thuật trực tuyến, từ mạng xã hội đến trang tin tức, đang ngày càng thúc đẩy việc học cỗ máy để hỗ trợ sự tiết kiệm. Nhưng quy trình này thường không cung cấp phản hồi cho tác giả mà sẽ giúp họ đóng góp theo hướng dẫn của cộng đồng. Điều này đòi hỏi quá nhiều thời gian cho những người điều khiển, và các phương pháp tính vẫn đang bắt đầu. Công việc này tập trung vào các mô hình có thể giúp diễn tả lại các bình luận độc hại theo một cách dân sự hơn. Nguồn cảm hứng từ những tiến bộ gần đây trong các công việc không ràng buộc lặp lại, một mô hình học tự giám sát được tạo ra, gọi là CAE-T1. CAE-T5 sử dụng một máy biến đổi văn bản với văn bản được đào tạo kỹ lưỡng, được chỉnh cẩn thận với một bộ giảm chỉ thị và máy mã hóa vòng. Thí nghiệm với dữ liệu phát hiện độc tính lớn nhất hiện nay (Ghi chú dân sự) mẫu của chúng ta tạo ra các câu lệnh thông thạo và giỏi giữ nội dung ban đầu hơn so với các hệ thống truyền tải kiểu văn bản trước đó, mà chúng ta so sánh với việc sử dụng nhiều hệ thống ghi điểm và đánh giá con người.', 'bg': 'Платформите, които поддържат онлайн коментари, от социалните мрежи до новинарските сайтове, все повече използват машинното обучение, за да подпомогнат усилията си за модериране. Но този процес обикновено не предоставя обратна връзка на автора, която би му помогнала да допринесе според насоките на общността. Това отнема твърде много време за човешките модератори, а изчислителните подходи все още се появяват. Тази работа се фокусира върху модели, които могат да помогнат да се предложи рефразиране на токсични коментари по по-граждански начин. Вдъхновен от неотдавнашния напредък в несвързаните задачи последователност към последователност, е въведен модел на самонаблюдение, наречен CAE-T5. Използва предварително обучен текст-текст трансформатор, който е фино настроен с денонизираща и циклична загуба на автоматичен кодер. Експериментирайки с най-големия набор от данни за откриване на токсичност до момента (Граждански коментари), нашият модел генерира изречения, които са по-плавни и по-добри в запазването на първоначалното съдържание в сравнение с по-ранните системи за трансфер на текстов стил, които сравняваме с използването на няколко системи за оценка и оценка на човека.', 'nl': 'Platforms die online commentaar ondersteunen, van sociale netwerken tot nieuwssites, maken steeds meer gebruik van machine learning om hun moderatieinspanningen te ondersteunen. Maar dit proces geeft meestal geen feedback aan de auteur die hen zou helpen bijdragen volgens de community richtlijnen. Dit is onbetaalbaar tijdrovend voor menselijke moderatoren om te doen, en computationele benaderingen zijn nog steeds in opkomst. Dit werk richt zich op modellen die kunnen helpen bij het formuleren van giftige reacties op een meer civiele manier. Geïnspireerd door recente vooruitgang in ongekoppelde sequence-to-sequence taken, wordt een zelfbegeleid leermodel geïntroduceerd, genaamd CAE-T5. CAE-T5 maakt gebruik van een vooraf getrainde tekst-naar-tekst transformator, die is verfijnd met een denoising en cyclisch auto-encoder verlies. Door te experimenteren met de grootste toxiciteitsdetectie dataset tot nu toe (Civil Comments) genereert ons model zinnen die vloeiender zijn en beter in het behouden van de oorspronkelijke inhoud in vergelijking met eerdere tekststijl transfersystemen die we vergelijken met het gebruik van verschillende scoresystemen en menselijke evaluaties.', 'hr': 'Platforme koje podržavaju komentar na internetu, od socijalnih mreža do novinskih sajtova, povećavaju učenje strojeva kako bi pomoglo njihovim moderacijskim naporima. Međutim, ovaj proces obično ne pruža reakciju autoru koji bi im pomogao da doprinesu u skladu s uputstvima zajednice. To je zabranično potrošenje vremena za ljudske moderatore, a računalni pristupi su još uvijek nascent. Ovaj rad se fokusira na modele koji mogu pomoći predložiti represiranje toksičnih komentara na građanski način. Inspiran nedavnim napretkom u neopravljenim zadacima u sekvenciji do sekvenciji, uvodi se model učenja koji se zove CAE-T5. CAE-T5 koristi predobučeni transformator teksta na tekst, koji je dobro uključen gubitkom indiciranja i cikličkog autokodera. Eksperimentiranje s najvećim datom za otkrivanje toksičnosti do sada (građanski komentari) naš model stvara rečenice koje su tečnije i bolje u očuvanju početnog sadržaja u usporedbi s ranijim sustavima prijenosa teksta stila koje uspoređujemo s korištenjem nekoliko sustava izvlačenja i ljudske procjene.', 'da': 'Platforme, der understøtter online kommentarer, fra sociale netværk til nyhedssider, udnytter i stigende grad maskinlæring til at hjælpe deres moderationsindsats. Men denne proces giver typisk ikke feedback til forfatteren, der ville hjælpe dem med at bidrage i henhold til fællesskabsretningslinjerne. Dette er uhensigtsmæssigt tidskrævende for menneskelige moderatorer at gøre, og beregningsmæssige tilgange er stadig begyndt. Dette arbejde fokuserer på modeller, der kan hjælpe med at foreslå omformulering af giftige kommentarer på en mere civil måde. Inspireret af de seneste fremskridt i uparrede sekvens-til-sekvensopgaver introduceres en selvovervåget læringsmodel, kaldet CAE-T5. CAE-T5 anvender en forududdannet tekst-til-tekst transformator, som er finjusteret med et denoising og cyklisk auto-encoder tab. Ved at eksperimentere med det største datasæt til dato (Civil Comments) genererer vores model sætninger, der er mere flydende og bedre til at bevare det oprindelige indhold sammenlignet med tidligere tekststileoverførselssystemer, som vi sammenligner med at bruge flere scoring systemer og menneskelig evaluering.', 'id': 'Platform yang mendukung komentar online, dari jaringan sosial ke situs berita, semakin menggunakan mesin belajar untuk membantu usaha moderasi mereka. Tapi proses ini biasanya tidak memberikan feedback kepada penulis yang akan membantu mereka berkontribusi menurut panduan komunitas. Ini menghabiskan waktu yang dilakukan oleh moderator manusia, dan pendekatan komputasi masih muncul. Pekerjaan ini fokus pada model yang dapat membantu menyarankan ulang kalimat komentar racun dengan cara yang lebih sipil. Terinspirasi oleh kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam tugas urutan-ke-urutan yang belum dipasang, model belajar yang diawasi sendiri diperkenalkan, disebut CAE-T5. CAE-T5 menggunakan transformer teks-ke-teks yang terlatih sebelumnya, yang disesuaikan dengan kehilangan pengekode otomatis. Experimenting with the largest toxicity detection dataset to date (Civil Comments) our model generates sentences that are more fluent and better at preserving the initial content compared to earlier text style transfer systems which we compare with using several scoring systems and human evaluation.', 'de': 'Plattformen, die Online-Kommentare unterstützen, von sozialen Netzwerken bis zu Nachrichtenseiten, nutzen zunehmend maschinelles Lernen, um ihre Moderationsbemühungen zu unterstützen. Aber dieser Prozess gibt dem Autor normalerweise kein Feedback, das ihm helfen würde, gemäß den Community-Richtlinien beizutragen. Dies ist für menschliche Moderatoren unerschwinglich zeitaufwändig, und computergestützte Ansätze sind immer noch im Entstehen. Diese Arbeit konzentriert sich auf Modelle, die helfen können, Umformulierungen von toxischen Kommentaren auf zivilere Weise vorzuschlagen. Inspiriert von den jüngsten Fortschritten bei ungepaarten Sequenz-zu-Sequenz Aufgaben wird ein selbstüberwachtes Lernmodell namens CAE-T5 eingeführt. CAE-T5 verwendet einen vorgetrainierten Text-zu-Text-Transformator, der mit einem denoisierenden und zyklischen Auto-Encoder-Verlust fein abgestimmt ist. Durch Experimente mit dem bisher größten Datensatz zur Toxizitätserkennung (Civil Comments) generiert unser Modell Sätze, die fließender sind und den ursprünglichen Inhalt besser erhalten als frühere Textstilübertragungssysteme, die wir mit mehreren Bewertungssystemen und menschlicher Bewertung vergleichen.', 'fa': 'Platforms that support online commentary, from social networks to news sites, are increasingly leveraging machine learning to assist their moderation efforts. ولی این فرایند معمولاً به نویسنده اعلام نمی\u200cکند که به آنها کمک می\u200cکند که بر اساس هدایت جامعه شرکت کنند. این برای مدیراتورهای انسانی که انجام می\u200cدهند، زمان\u200cconsumption قانونی است، و روش\u200cهای محاسباتی هنوز ناتوان است. این کار روی مدل\u200cها تمرکز می\u200cکند که می\u200cتوانند کمک کنند به پیشنهاد بازگشت توضیح\u200cهای سمی به طریق جامعه\u200cتر. توسط پیشرفت اخیر در وظیفه\u200cهای مختلف و سرنوشته\u200cهای مختلف، یک مدل یادگیری که خود را بررسی می\u200cکند، به نام CAE-T5 معرفی می\u200cشود. CAE-T5 یک تغییردهنده متن به متن پیش آموزش شده را استفاده می\u200cکند، که با یک خسارت دادن و دوچرخه\u200cای از خسارت\u200cدهنده\u200cی خودکار و کودردهنده\u200cی خودکار بسیار خوب تنظیم می\u200cشود. تجربه با بزرگترین مجموعه داده های شناسایی سمی تا حالا (توضیح\u200cهای داخلی) مدل ما جمله\u200cهایی را که در مقایسه با سیستم\u200cهای انتقال\u200cسازی متن پیشینیان محتوای آغاز بیشتر و بهتر از محتوای ابتدایی متن را در مقایسه با استفاده از چند سیستم\u200cهای آغاز و ارزیابی انسان می', 'ko': '소셜네트워크서비스(SNS)부터 뉴스 사이트까지 온라인 평론을 지원하는 플랫폼들이 기계 학습을 이용해 조정을 돕고 있다.그러나 이 과정은 보통 작가에게 피드백을 제공하지 않고 그들이 지역 사회 지침에 따라 공헌하도록 돕는다.이것은 인류 조절자에게 매우 많은 시간을 소모하는 것으로 계산 방법은 여전히 맹아 단계에 있다.이 사업의 중점은 모형으로 독설을 더욱 문명하게 재해석하는 데 도움을 줄 수 있다는 것이다.시퀀스에서 시퀀스 임무로의 최신 진전에 대한 쌍을 이루지 못하는 영감을 받아 CAE-T5라는 자체 감독 학습 모델을 도입했다.CAE-T5는 잡음 제거와 순환 자동 인코더 손실을 미세하게 조정하기 위해 미리 훈련된 텍스트-텍스트 변환기를 사용합니다.지금까지 가장 큰 독성 검출 데이터 세트(Civil Comments)에 대한 실험을 통해 우리 모델이 생성한 문장은 초기의 텍스트 스타일 전환 시스템보다 원활하고 초기 내용을 잘 보존했다. 우리는 몇 가지 평가 시스템과 인류 평가를 비교했다.', 'sw': 'Jukwaa ambazo zinaunga mkono maoni ya mtandaoni, kutoka mitandao ya kijamii hadi tovuti za habari, zinazidi kutumia vifaa vya kujifunza ili kusaidia jitihada zao za kisasa. Lakini mchakato huu kwa kawaida hautoa maoni kwa mwandishi ambaye ingewasaidia kuchangia kwa mujibu wa maelekezo ya jamii. Hii ni matumizi ya muda kwa ajili ya wageni wa kibinadamu kufanya hivyo, na hatua za hesabu bado zinazidi kuwa mbaya. Kazi hii inajikita kwenye mifano ambayo inaweza kusaidia kupendekeza mabadiliko ya maoni ya kutosha kwa namna ya kiraia zaidi. Kuhamishwa na maendeleo ya hivi karibuni katika kazi zisizo na mfululizo wa mfululizo, modeli ya kujifunza inaonyesha, inayoitwa CAE-T5. CAE-T5 anatumia mabadiliko ya ujumbe wa ujumbe wa simu za mkononi hadi ujumbe wa ujumbe, ambayo ni vizuri kwa kupoteza kwa uchunguzi na kupunguza kodi ya mzunguko. Kujaribu na taarifa kubwa zaidi za kutambua ukosefu wa vibaya hadi sasa (Comments of Civil) model yetu inatengeneza sentensi ambazo ni yenye ufanisi zaidi na bora zaidi katika kuhifadhi maudhui ya mwanzo yanalinganisha na mfumo wa usafirishaji wa mitandao ya awali ya maandishi ambao tunalinganisha na kutumia mifumo kadhaa ya uchunguzi na uchunguzi wa binadamu.', 'tr': 'Çaltylyk komentaryny, sosyal neteweklerinden täze habarlar bilen, maşynlaryň moderasy çabalaryna kömek etmek üçin öwrenmelerini kömekleýärler. Emma bu proses adatça jemgyýet gurultaýlaryna görä kömekleşen awtora jogap berenok. Bu adamlaryň moderatorlary üçin wagtyň ýüzüni ýok etmäge yasaklaýar we bilgisayar ýakynlaşyklary heniz ýok. Bu işe zehirli töwürler täzeliklerini taýýarlamak üçin kömek edip biljek nusgalara üns berýär. Soňky ösümlikler tarapyndan daşyrylmadyk sequence-to-sequence işlerinde täsirlenýär, CAE-T5 diýip atlandyrylýan öwrenme nusgasyna görýär. CAE-T5 öňünden eğlenen metin-täze metin çeviricisini işleýär. Bu da bilikli otomatik kodlayıcı ýitimi bilen düzeltildi. Şimdiye çenli iň uly toksik tanyş verileri bilen (Civil Comments) modelimiz sözlerimizi iň akylly we gowy sözlerimizi ilkinji metin taryşynyň sistemleri bilen gurlaşýan ýagdaýda görä çykarýan metin taryşynyň sistemleri bilen döredilýär.', 'sq': "Platforma që mbështesin komentet online, nga rrjetet shoqërore në faqet e lajmeve, po nxjerrin gjithnjë e më tepër nxitje nga mësimi i makinave për të ndihmuar përpjekjet e tyre të moderimit. Por ky proces zakonisht nuk i jep feedback autorit që do t'i ndihmonte ata të kontribuonin sipas udhëzimeve të komunitetit. Kjo kërkon shumë kohë për moderatorët e njerëzve dhe metodat kompjuterike janë ende në rritje. Ky punë përqëndrohet në modele që mund të ndihmojnë të sugjerojnë rifreshime të komenteve toksike në një mënyrë më civile. Inspiruar nga përparimi i fundit në detyrat e pashpejtuara sekuencë-në-sekuencë, futet një model mësimi i mbikqyrur vetë, i quajtur CAE-T5. CAE-T5 punon një transformues teksti-teksti të trajnuar, i cili është i përshtatur mirë me një humbje të denozimit dhe të autokoduesit ciklik. Eksperimentimi me të dhënat më të mëdha për zbulimin e toksicitetit deri më tani (Komentarë Civile) modeli ynë gjeneron fjalime që janë më të fluente dhe më të mira në ruajtjen e përmbajtjes fillestare krahasuar me sistemet e mëparshme të transferimit të stilit të tekstit që ne krahasojmë me përdorimin e disa sistemeve të shënimit dhe vlerësimit njerëzor.", 'af': "Platvorms wat online kommentaar ondersteun, van sosiale netwerke tot nuuswebwerke, word die meerder verplig van masjien leer om hul moderasie versoekte te help. Maar hierdie proses verskaf nie tipik terugmelding aan die outeur wat hulle sal help by bydraai volgens die gemeenskap-gidsels nie. Hierdie is prohibitiewe tyd-gebruik vir menslike moderators om te doen, en rekenasielike toegang is nog nascent. Hierdie werk fokus op modele wat kan hulp voorstel om te herhaal van toksiske kommentaar op 'n meer siviele manier. Inspireer deur onlangse vordering in onverrigte volgorde-na-volgorde taak, 'n self-superviseerde leermodel is ingevoer, CAE-T5 genoem. CAE- T5 gebruik 'n voorafgeleerde teks- na- teks- transformeerder, wat is fyn gedoen met' n belangrike en sykliese outo- enkoder verlies. Om te eksperimenteer met die grootste toksiciteit-beskrywing datastel tot dag (Civile Kommentaar) ons model genereer setinge wat meer fluent en beter is om die inisiale inhoud te bewaar vergelyk met vorige teks-styl oordragstelsels wat ons vergelyk met die gebruik van verskeie skoring-stelsels en menslike evaluering.", 'az': 'ńįnternet komentarisini d…ôst…ôkl…ôy…ôn platformlar, sosyal Ňü…ôb…ôk…ôl…ôrd…ôn haqq-hesab sit…ôl…ôrin…ô q…ôd…ôr, moderasiya √ßabalarńĪna k√∂m…ôk etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn maŇüńĪn √∂yr…ônm…ôsini artńĪrar. Lakin bu proses insanlara k√∂m…ôk ed…ôc…ôk yazńĪcńĪna qarŇüńĪlńĪq verm…ôz. Bu insan moderatorlarńĪn ed…ôc…ôyi vaxt istifad…ôsi qadańüan edilmiŇüdir, hesaplayaraq yaxńĪnlńĪqlarńĪ h…ôl…ô d…ô nazil olmuŇüdur. Bu iŇüin daha sivil yolla zehirli komentatlarńĪn yenil…ônm…ôsin…ô k√∂m…ôk ed…ô bil…ôn modell…ôr…ô odaqlanńĪr. YaxńĪnlńĪq edilm…ômiŇü sequence-to-sequence iŇül…ôrind…ô qeyri-t…ôdbir t…ôdbir edilmiŇüdir, CAE-T5 adlńĪ √∂yr…ônm…ô modeli t…ôŇükil edilmiŇüdir. CAE-T5 t…ôhsil edilmiŇü metin-to-metin transformat√ßńĪsńĪnńĪ istifad…ô edir. Bu, bel…ôlikl…ô v…ô ciklik avtomatik kodlayńĪcńĪ z…ôr…ôri il…ô yaxŇüńĪ t…ôhsil edilir. Ňěimdiye q…ôd…ôr b√∂y√ľk toxicit keŇüif veril…ôn veril…ônl…ôrl…ô t…ôcr√ľb…ô edirik. Modelimiz √ßoxlu scoring sisteml…ôri v…ô insan deńüerlendirm…ôl…ôri il…ô qarŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrdńĪńüńĪmńĪz ilk m…ôlumatńĪ qorumaq √ľ√ß√ľn daha ańüńĪr v…ô daha xeyirli c√ľml…ôl…ôr yaradńĪr.', 'bn': 'যে প্ল্যাটফর্ম অনলাইন মন্তব্য সমর্থন করে, সামাজিক যোগাযোগ নেটওয়ার্ক থেকে সংবাদ সাইট থেকে বাড়তে থাকে তাদের আধুনিক প্রচেষ্ কিন্তু এই প্রক্রিয়া সাধারণত লেখকের কাছে প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রদান করে না, যা সম্প্রদায়ের নির্দেশ অনুযায়ী তাদের সাহা এটা মানুষের আধুনিক শিক্ষার্থীদের জন্য নিষিদ্ধ সময়ের খাবার এবং গণনাত্রিক পদ্ধতি এখনো খারাপ। এই কাজের মোডেলের উপর মনোযোগ দিয়েছে যারা ব্যস্ত মন্তব্যের পুনরায় ব্যস্ত মন্তব্য প্রদান করতে পারে। Inspired by recent progress in unpaired sequence-to-sequence tasks, a self-supervised learning model is introduced, called CAE-T5.  CAE-T5 পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত টেক্সট থেকে টেক্সট পরিবর্তন করেছে, যা ডেনোজিং এবং সাইক্লিক স্বয়ংক্রিয় স্বয়ংক্রিয় এনকোডারের ক্ষতির বৃহত্তম ব্যাক্তিগত সনাক্তির তথ্য (সিভিল মন্তব্য) পরীক্ষা করা আমাদের মডেলের শাস্তি তৈরি করে যা আরো উৎসাহিত এবং পূর্ববর্তী টেক্সটেল পরিবর্তন সিস্টেমের তুলনায় প্রাথমিক', 'hy': 'Պլատֆորմերը, որոնք աջակցում են առցանց մեկնաբանությունը, սոցիալական ցանցերից մինչև նորությունների կայքերը, ավելի ու ավելի օգնում են մեքենային ուսումնասիրությունը, որպեսզի օգնեն իրենց կարեւորությունը: Բայց այս գործընթացը սովորաբար հեղինակին արձագանք չի տալիս, որը կօգնի նրանց ներդրումը համաձայն համայնքի ուղղությունների: Սա արգելափակ ժամանակ է պահանջում մարդկային մոդերատորների համար, և հաշվարկների մոտեցումները դեռևս սկսում են ապրել: Այս աշխատանքը կենտրոնանում է մոդելների վրա, որոնք կարող են օգնել առաջարկել թունավոր մեկնաբանությունների վերարտահայտումները ավելի քաղաքացիական ձևով: Հոգեշնչված վերջերս առաջընթացով անփոփոխ հաջորդականության առջև հաջորդականության խնդիրներում, ներկայացվում է ինքնավերահսկվող ուսուցման մոդել, որը կոչվում է CAE-T5: CAE-T5-ը օգտագործում է նախապատրաստված տեքստի-տեքստի վերափոխողը, որը լավ կազմակերպված է մերժման և ցիկլային ավտոկոդերի կորստի հետ: Experimenting with the largest toxicity detection dataset to date (Civil Comments) our model generates sentences that are more fluent and better at preserving the initial content compared to earlier text style transfer systems which we compare with using several scoring systems and human evaluation.', 'bs': 'Platforme koje podržavaju komentar na internetu, od socijalnih mreža do novinskih sajtova, uvećavaju učenje mašine kako bi pomoglo njihovim moderacijskim naporima. Ali ovaj proces obično ne pruža reakciju autoru koji bi im pomogao da doprinesu u skladu sa uputstvima zajednice. Ovo je zabranjujuće potrošenje vremena za ljudske moderatore, a računalni pristupi su još uvijek nascent. Ovaj rad se fokusira na modele koji mogu pomoći predložiti represiranje toksičnih komentara na građanski način. Inspiran nedavnim napretkom u neopravljenim zadacima sekvence do sekvence, uvodi se model učenja koji se zove CAE-T5. CAE-T5 upotrebljava predobučeni transformator teksta na tekst, koji je u redu prilagođen gubitkom indiciranja i cikličkog autokodera. Eksperimentirajući sa najvećim kompletom datoteka za otkrivanje toksičnosti do sada (civilni komentari) naš model stvara rečenice koje su tečnije i bolje u očuvanju početnog sadržaja u usporedbi sa ranijim sustavima prebacivanja teksta stila koje uspoređujemo s korištenjem nekoliko sustava izvlačenja i ljudske procjene.', 'ca': "Les plataformes que donen suport al comentari en línia, des de les xarxes socials fins als llocs de notícies, cada cop més utilitzen l'aprenentatge màquina per ajudar els seus esforços de moderació. Però aquest procés normalment no proporciona feedback a l'autor que els ajudaria a contribuir segons les directrices comunitaries. Això consumeix molt de temps per als moderadors humans, i els enfocaments computacionals encara estan nascents. Aquesta feina es centra en models que poden ajudar a suggerir reflexions de comentaris tòxics de manera més civil. Inspirat pel progrés recent en tasques sense seqüència a seqüència, es introdueix un model d'aprenentatge autosupervisat, anomenat CAE-T5. CAE-T5 employs a pre-trained text-to-text transformer, which is fine tuned with a denoising and cyclic auto-encoder loss.  Experimentant amb el conjunt de dades de detecció de toxicitat més gran fins ara (Comentaris Civils), el nostre model genera frases que són més fluents i millors en conservar el contingut inicial comparats amb sistemes anteriors de transfer ència d'estils de text que comparem amb l'ús de diversos sistemes de puntuació i evaluació humana.", 'cs': 'Platformy, které podporují online komentáře, od sociálních sítí po zpravodajské stránky, stále více využívají strojové učení, aby pomohly jejich moderačním úsilím. Tento proces však obvykle neposkytuje autorovi zpětnou vazbu, která by jim pomohla přispět v souladu s pokyny komunity. To je pro lidské moderátory nepříliš časově náročné a výpočetní přístupy jsou stále vznikající. Tato práce se zaměřuje na modely, které mohou pomoci navrhnout přeformulování toxických komentářů civilnějším způsobem. Inspirován nedávným pokrokem v nepárovaných úlohách sekvence na sekvenci je představen model učení s názvem CAE-T5. CAE-T5 využívá předem trénovaný text-text transformátor, který je jemně vyladěn denoisační a cyklickou ztrátou autokodéru. Experimentováním s největším datovým souborem detekce toxicity dosud (Civil Comments) generuje náš model věty, které jsou plynulější a lepší v zachování počátečního obsahu ve srovnání s dřívějšími systémy přenosu textu, které porovnáváme s použitím několika bodovacích systémů a lidského hodnocení.', 'et': 'Platvormid, mis toetavad online-kommentaare, sotsiaalvõrgustikest uudiste saitideni, kasutavad üha enam masinõpet, et aidata kaasa nende modereerimisele. Kuid see protsess ei anna tavaliselt autorile tagasisidet, mis aitaks neil vastavalt kogukonna juhistele panustada. See on inimmoderaatorite jaoks liiga aeganõudev ja arvutuslikud lähenemisviisid on endiselt tekkinud. Käesolev töö keskendub mudelitele, mis võivad aidata soovitada toksiliste kommentaaride ümbersõnastamist tsiviillikumal viisil. Inspireerituna hiljutistest edusammudelitest paarimata järjestusest järjestusse toimuvates ülesannetes, võetakse kasutusele isejärelevalvega õppemudel CAE-T5. CAE-T5 kasutab eelnevalt väljaõpetatud teksti-teksti trafot, mis on peeneks häälestatud denoiseeriva ja tsüklilise automaatkodeerija kaduga. Eksperimenteerides seni suurimat toksilisuse tuvastamise andmekogumit (tsiviilkommentaarid), loob meie mudel lauseid, mis on sujuvamad ja paremad esialgse sisu säilitamisel võrreldes varasemate tekstistiilide edastamise süsteemidega, mida me võrdleme mitme punktisüsteemi ja inimhindamisega.', 'fi': 'Verkkokommentointia tukevat alustat sosiaalisista verkostoista uutissivustoihin hyödyntävät yhä enemmän koneoppimista moderointipyrkimyksensä tueksi. Tämä prosessi ei kuitenkaan yleensä anna tekijälle palautetta, joka auttaisi heitä osallistumaan yhteisön ohjeiden mukaisesti. Ihmismoderaattoreille tämä on liian aikaa vievää, ja laskennalliset lähestymistavat ovat yhä syntymässä. Tässä työssä keskitytään malleihin, jotka voivat auttaa ehdottamaan myrkyllisten kommenttien uudelleenmuotoilua sivistyneemmin. Tuoreimman edistyksen innoittamana parittomissa sekvenssitehtävissä esitellään itseohjattu oppimismalli nimeltä CAE-T5. CAE-T5 käyttää esikoulutettua teksti-tekstimuuntajaa, joka on hienoviritetty denoising ja syklinen automaattinen koodaushäviö. Kokeilemalla tähän mennessä suurinta myrkyllisyyden havaitsemistietoaineistoa (Civil Comments) mallimme tuottaa lauseita, jotka ovat sujuvampia ja säilyttävät alkuperäisen sisällön paremmin kuin aikaisemmat tekstityylin siirtojärjestelmät, joita vertaamme useiden pisteytysjärjestelmien ja ihmisten arviointiin.', 'am': 'የኢንተርኔት ውይይት የሚደግፉ ፕላውንዶች፣ ከማኅበራዊ መረብ ጀምሮ እስከ ዜና ድረ ገጾች፣ ማሻሻሻዎችን ለመረዳት የሚችሉትን መሳፍን የሚጨምሩ ናቸው፡፡ ነገር ግን ይህ ፕሮጀክት በመጠቀም ማኅበረሰብ መሪ እንደሚረዳቸው ለጸሐፊው መልስ ጥያቄ አያደርግም፡፡ ይህ የሰው አካባቢዎች ለመሥራት የተከለከለ የጊዜው መጠቀሚያ ነው፣ የቁጥጥር ቀዳጆችም ገና ረክሶች ናቸው፡፡ ይሄ ሥራ በተጨማሪው የባሕላዊ አስተያየት ማሰናከል የሚችል ሞዴላዎች ላይ ነው፡፡ በአሁኑ ጊዜ በተጨማሪው ቁጥር-ወደ-ቁረይት ስራዎችን በመግለጥ የሚታየው የራሱ ተማሪ ሞዴል CAE-T5 የሚባል ነው፡፡ CAE-T5 አስቀድሞ የተማረከ ጽሑፍ-ወደ-ጽሑፍ ለውጥ ያስተካክላል፡፡ እስከ ዛሬ ድረስ በተለየ ትልቁ የጥምቀት ማግኘት ዳታዎችን (የሲቪል Comments) በመፈተና ሞዴላዎቻችን የፊተኛውን የጽሑፍ መተላለፊያ ሥርዓት እና ከሰው ምርጫዎች ጋር በማስተካከል እና ከመጠቀም የበለጠ የጽሑፍ መተላለፊያ ሥርዓት በማስቀመጥ ይፍጠርናል፡፡', 'sk': 'Platforme, ki podpirajo spletne komentarje, od družbenih omrežij do strani z novicami, vedno bolj izkoriščajo strojno učenje za pomoč pri njihovih moderacijah. Vendar ta proces običajno avtorju ne zagotavlja povratnih informacij, ki bi jim pomagale prispevati v skladu s smernicami skupnosti. To je za človeške moderatorje precej dolgotrajno, računalniški pristopi pa še vedno nastajajo. To delo se osredotoča na modele, ki lahko pomagajo predlagati preoblikovanje strupenih komentarjev na bolj civilen način. Na podlagi nedavnega napredka pri neparnih opravilih iz zaporedja do zaporedja je uveden model samonadzorovanega učenja, imenovan CAE-T5. CAE-T5 uporablja vnaprej usposobljen transformator besedila v besedilo, ki je natančno nastavljen z denoiziranjem in ciklično izgubo samokodirnika. Z eksperimentiranjem z največjim dosedanjim naborom podatkov o odkrivanju toksičnosti (Civilni komentarji) naš model ustvari stavke, ki so tekočejši in boljši pri ohranjanju začetne vsebine v primerjavi s prejšnjimi sistemi prenosa sloga besedila, ki jih primerjamo z uporabo več sistemov ocenjevanja in ocenjevanjem človeka.', 'jv': 'Plastik sing dipunangé komentar online, mengko tambah sithik tambah lan situs tambah, lan akeh njaluk sing nyimpen pengguna bantuan ingkang ngerayakno modèran. Perusahaan iki ora ngerewang kelambak kanggo autor sing nyulung bantuan ngono nggawe barang komunitas. Iki kanggo ngerasai kanggo ijol-ijolan kanggo ngeruhake Moderator sing bisa nggawe, lan sakjane sampeyan sing isih durung. Awak iki dipun ngomong ing model sing iso ngéwangi ngéwangi répangan komentar tok sing luwih apik lan tambah sing luwih apik. Lah bener CaE-T 5 emphasis a advanced text-to-text transformer, that is Fined tuned with a deniing and ciClic auto-decoder lose. Geweke nambah karo data sing dumadhi kanggo kalendahing (Komentar Cino) model nambah sing dumadhi winih sing luwih dumadhi kanggo nggawe nggawe pertualangan tentang sampeyan sampeyan karo sistem nggawe oleh dumadhi sing paling dhéwé', 'ha': "Platforms that support online commentary, from social networks to news sites, are increasingly leveraging machine learning to assist their moderation efforts.  Amma wannan jarraba bã ya bãyar da feedback ga mai rubũtãwa wanda zai iya ƙara su da amfani da shiryoyin jamii. Wannan an haramta abincin lokaci ne ga mutane da za su yi aiki, kuma hanyõyin hisãbi sun yi kamid. Wannan aikin yana fokus a kan misãlai da za ta iya ƙara wa misalin mutane na cire. An Inspire da jaroyi na farko cikin aikin da ba'a haɗe sauti-to-sequence ba, an introduce wata motel mai tsaron kwamfyuta da kansa na tsare, ana kallo CAE T5. CAET-T5 na yi amfani da wata shishi na matsayin-zuwa-matsayin mai gabã ɗaya, wanda aka yi amfani da shi da wata hasãra mai kwamfyuta farat ɗaya. Ana jarrabi da data na gane kwamfyuta mafi girma a yanzu (Cikin Commons) yana ƙara zasu kalmõmi waɗanda ke mafi masu sanyi da kuma mafi alhẽri ga tsari tsarin maɓallin farko da sami'a da tsarin tsari na zaman matsayin transfusi na rubutu wanda Muke sammenliki da amfani da wasu na'urar-nau'in na'ura da kima.", 'bo': 'དྲ་ཐོག་གི་མཆན་འགྲེལ་བཤད་དང་། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་དྲ་ཐོག་ནས་གསར་འགྱུར་གནས་ཚུལ་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་དུས་མཐུན་ཤེས་སྐྱོང་བའི་གྲ་ འོན་ཀྱང་། ལས་སྦྱོར་འདིས་རྩོམ་པ་པོ་ལ་དང་འཁྲིད་སྐྱོང་བྱེད་མི་ཐུབ་པ་ལས་མང་ཙམ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དང་། འདི་ནི་མིའི་འཇུག་རྟེན་འདི་བྱེད་པའི་ཆུ་ཚོད་ལས་བརྟན་པར་ལས་ཕར་ཆད་ཆེན་པ་རེད། ལས་ཀ་འདིས་མིག་གཟུགས་རྣམས་ལ་མཐོང་བྱེད་པའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་སྔར་བསྐྱར་གསོ་བྱེད་སྐབས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་། རང་ཉིད་ལྟ་རྟོག་པའི་འཕེལ་རིམ་གྱི་འཕེལ་རིམ་དང་ལས་རྗེས་ཀྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་བཏོན་ཡོད་པ་ལྟར། རང་ཉིད་ལྟ་རྟོག་པའི་སློབ་དཔེ་ CAE-T5 employs a pre-trained text-to-text transformer, which is fine tuned with a denomination and cyclic auto-encoder loss. འུ་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ལྟར་སྐྱེལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འགོ་འཛུགས་པའི་ནང་དོན', 'he': 'פלטפורמות שמתמכות בפרסומות באינטרנט, מרשתות חברתיות לאתרי חדשות, משתמשות יותר ויותר במכונות ללמוד כדי לסייע למאמציהם למדידות. אבל התהליך הזה בדרך כלל לא מספק חזרה לכותב שיעזור להם לתרום לפי המדרגות הקהילתיות. This is prohibitively time-consuming for human moderators to do, and computational approaches are still nascent.  העבודה הזאת מתמקדת בדוגמנים שיכולים לעזור להציע שינויים של תגובות רעילות בדרך אזרחית יותר. בהשראה מההתקדמות האחרונה במשימות רצף לרצף, מודל למידה מופעל על עצמו, שנקרא CAE-T5. CAE-T5 משתמש במעבר טקסט-טקסט-לטקסט מאומן מראש, אשר מתאים יפה עם אובדן קודד אוטומטי מכונן ומחזור. Experimenting with the largest toxicity detection dataset to date (Civil Comments) our model generates sentences that are more fluent and better at preserving the initial content compared to earlier text style transfer systems which we compare with using several scoring systems and human evaluation.'}
{'en': 'Generating Weather Comments from Meteorological Simulations', 'ar': 'توليد تعليقات الطقس من محاكاة الأرصاد الجوية', 'fr': 'Générer des commentaires météorologiques à partir de simulations météorologiques', 'es': 'Generación de comentarios meteorológicos a partir de simulaciones meteorológicas', 'pt': 'Gerando comentários climáticos a partir de simulações meteorológicas', 'ja': '気象シミュレーションからの天気コメントの生成', 'zh': '从气象拟生成天气注', 'hi': 'मौसम संबंधी सिमुलेशन से मौसम टिप्पणियाँ उत्पन्न करना', 'ru': 'Формирование погодных комментариев в результате метеорологического моделирования', 'ga': 'Tuairimí Aimsire a Ghiniúint ó Insamhaltaí Meitéareolaíochta', 'el': 'Δημιουργία καιρικών σχολίων από μετεωρολογικές προσομοιώσεις', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Időjárási megjegyzések generálása meteorológiai szimulációkból', 'it': 'Generare commenti meteorologici da simulazioni meteorologiche', 'lt': 'Meteorologinių simuliacijų meteorologinių pastabų sukūrimas', 'mk': 'Генерирам временски коментари од метеоролошки симулации', 'kk': 'Метеорологикалық симуляциялардан ауа түсініктемелерді құру', 'mn': 'Meteorological Simulation-аас цаг агаарын тэмдэглэгүүдийг үүсгэх', 'ms': 'Menjana Komen Cuaca dari Simulasi Meteorological', 'mt': 'Il-Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Kummenti dwar it-temp minn Simulazzjonijiet Meteoroloġiċi', 'ml': 'മെറ്റിയോളജിക്കല്\u200d സിമുലേഷനില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള കാലാവസ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു', 'no': 'Lagar vêrkommentar frå meteorologiske simulasjonar', 'ro': 'Generarea comentariilor meteorologice din simularile meteorologice', 'pl': 'Generowanie komentarzy pogodowych z symulacji meteorologicznych', 'sr': 'Generiranje komentara meteoroloških simulacija', 'si': 'මීටරෝලික සැකසුම්කරණයෙන් වාත කිරීමක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා', 'sv': 'Generera väderkommentarer från meteorologiska simuleringar', 'ta': 'வானிலை பாவனைகளிலிருந்து வானிலை குறிப்புகளை உருவாக்குகிறது', 'so': 'Generation weather Comments from Meteorological Simulations', 'ur': 'Meteorological Simulations', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tạo ảnh đối tượng', 'hr': 'Generiranje komentara meteoroloških simulacija', 'da': 'Genererer vejrbemærkninger fra meteorologiske simuleringer', 'bg': 'Генериране на метеорологични коментари от метеорологични симулации', 'nl': 'Weeropmerkingen genereren vanuit meteorologische simulaties', 'ko': '기상 시뮬레이션에서 날씨 평론 생성', 'fa': 'ایجاد توضیح هوا از شبیه\u200cسازی\u200cهای meteorological', 'de': 'Generierung von Wetterkommentaren aus meteorologischen Simulationen', 'id': 'Membuat Komentar Cuaca dari Simulasi Meteorologi', 'sw': 'Kutengeneza Maoni ya hewa kutoka Simulations of Meteorological', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i komenteve të motit nga Simulimet Meteorologjike', 'tr': 'Hat Taýýarlaryndan Wagtlaýyn Töwzih Edilýär', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Մետեոլոգիական սիմուլյացից ստեղծելով եղանակի մեկնաբանություններ', 'bn': 'আবহাওয়া মন্তব্য তৈরি করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Generiranje komentara meteoroloških simulacija', 'ca': 'Generant comentaris meteorològics a partir de simulacions meteorològiques', 'cs': 'Generování poznámek k počasí z meteorologických simulací', 'et': 'Ilmakommentaaride genereerimine meteoroloogilistest simulatsioonidest', 'fi': 'Sääkommenttien luominen meteorologisista simuloinneista', 'af': 'Name', 'az': 'Meteorolojik Sim칲lasyonlardan Hava T톛rc칲m톛l톛ri Olur', 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje vremenskih komentarjev iz meteoroloških simulacij', 'he': 'יצירת הערות מזג האוויר מסימולוגיות מטאורולוגיות', 'bo': 'དྲོས་ཚད་ལུས་སྟངས་དང་བསྟུན་ནས་དུས་ཁ་ཤས་གསར་བཟོ་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Ngubah Kemerdekaan Latar kang Simulasi Metorologik'}
{'en': 'The task of generating weather-forecast comments from meteorological simulations has the following requirements : (i) the changes in numerical values for various physical quantities need to be considered, (ii) the weather comments should be dependent on delivery time and area information, and (iii) the comments should provide useful information for users. To meet these requirements, we propose a data-to-text model that incorporates three types of encoders for numerical forecast maps, observation data, and meta-data. We also introduce weather labels representing weather information, such as sunny and rain, for our model to explicitly describe useful information. We conducted automatic and human evaluations. The results indicate that our model performed best against baselines in terms of informativeness. We make our code and data publicly available.', 'fr': "La tâche de générer des commentaires de prévisions météorologiques à partir de simulations météorologiques comporte les exigences suivantes\xa0: (i) les changements de valeurs numériques pour diverses grandeurs physiques doivent être pris en compte, (ii) les commentaires météorologiques doivent dépendre des informations sur le temps de livraison et la zone, et (iii) les commentaires devraient fournir des informations utiles aux utilisateurs. Pour répondre à ces exigences, nous proposons un modèle de données en texte qui intègre trois types d'encodeurs pour les cartes de prévisions numériques, les données d'observation et les métadonnées. Nous introduisons également des étiquettes météorologiques représentant des informations météorologiques, telles que le soleil et la pluie, pour notre modèle afin de décrire explicitement des informations utiles. Nous avons mené des évaluations automatiques et humaines. Les résultats indiquent que notre modèle a obtenu les meilleurs résultats par rapport aux données de référence en termes d'informativité. Nous mettons notre code et nos données à la disposition du public.", 'pt': 'A tarefa de gerar comentários de previsão meteorológica a partir de simulações meteorológicas tem os seguintes requisitos: (i) as mudanças nos valores numéricos para várias grandezas físicas precisam ser consideradas, (ii) os comentários meteorológicos devem ser dependentes do tempo de entrega e informações de área, e (iii) os comentários devem fornecer informações úteis para os usuários. Para atender a esses requisitos, propomos um modelo de dados para texto que incorpora três tipos de codificadores para mapas de previsão numérica, dados de observação e metadados. Também introduzimos rótulos climáticos que representam informações meteorológicas, como sol e chuva, para que nosso modelo descreva explicitamente informações úteis. Realizamos avaliações automáticas e humanas. Os resultados indicam que nosso modelo teve melhor desempenho em relação às linhas de base em termos de informatividade. Disponibilizamos nosso código e dados publicamente.', 'ar': 'تتطلب مهمة إنشاء تعليقات التنبؤ بالطقس من عمليات محاكاة الأرصاد الجوية المتطلبات التالية: (1) يجب مراعاة التغييرات في القيم العددية للكميات المادية المختلفة ، (2) يجب أن تعتمد تعليقات الطقس على وقت التسليم ومعلومات المنطقة ، و (3) يجب أن توفر التعليقات معلومات مفيدة للمستخدمين. لتلبية هذه المتطلبات ، نقترح نموذجًا لتحويل البيانات إلى نص يشتمل على ثلاثة أنواع من الترميز لخرائط التنبؤ الرقمية وبيانات المراقبة والبيانات الوصفية. نقدم أيضًا ملصقات الطقس التي تمثل معلومات الطقس ، مثل المشمس والمطر ، لنموذجنا لوصف المعلومات المفيدة بشكل صريح. أجرينا تقييمات تلقائية وبشرية. تشير النتائج إلى أن نموذجنا أدى بشكل أفضل مقارنة بخطوط الأساس من حيث المعلوماتية. نجعل كودنا وبياناتنا متاحة للجمهور.', 'es': 'La tarea de generar comentarios sobre el pronóstico del tiempo a partir de simulaciones meteorológicas tiene los siguientes requisitos: (i) deben tenerse en cuenta los cambios en los valores numéricos para diversas cantidades físicas, (ii) los comentarios meteorológicos deben depender del tiempo de entrega y la información del área, y (iii) los comentarios debe proporcionar información útil para los usuarios. Para cumplir con estos requisitos, proponemos un modelo de datos a texto que incorpora tres tipos de codificadores para mapas de pronóstico numérico, datos de observación y metadatos. También introducimos etiquetas meteorológicas que representan información meteorológica, como sol y lluvia, para que nuestro modelo describa explícitamente información útil. Realizamos evaluaciones automáticas y humanas. Los resultados indican que nuestro modelo se desempeñó mejor en comparación con las líneas de base en términos de capacidad de información. Ponemos a disposición del público nuestro código y nuestros datos.', 'ru': 'Задача подготовки комментариев по прогнозам погоды в результате метеорологического моделирования требует выполнения следующих требований: i) необходимо учитывать изменения в числовых значениях для различных физических величин, ii) комментарии по погоде должны зависеть от времени доставки и информации о районе и iii) комментарии должны содержать полезную информацию для пользователей. Для удовлетворения этих требований мы предлагаем модель типа "данные в текст", которая включает три типа кодировщиков для числовых карт прогнозов, данных наблюдений и метаданных. Мы также вводим этикетки погоды, представляющие информацию о погоде, такую как солнечная и дождливая, для того, чтобы наша модель четко описывала полезную информацию. Мы проводили автоматические и человеческие оценки. Результаты показывают, что наша модель показала лучшие результаты по сравнению с базовыми показателями с точки зрения информативности. Мы делаем наш код и данные общедоступными.', 'ja': '気象シミュレーションから天気予報コメントを生成する作業には、(i)様々な物理量の数値の変化を考慮する必要があり、(ii)天気コメントは配信時間とエリア情報に依存し、(iii)コメントはユーザーに有用な情報を提供する必要があります。これらの要件を満たすために、数値予報マップ、観測データ、メタデータの3種類のエンコーダを組み込んだデータツーテキストモデルを提案します。また、モデルが有用な情報を明示的に説明するために、晴れや雨などの気象情報を表す気象ラベルも導入しています。自動評価と人間評価を行いました。結果は、当社のモデルが情報性の観点からベースラインに対して最も優れたパフォーマンスを発揮したことを示しています。当社はコードとデータを公開しています。', 'zh': '气象之成天气预报论事有以下:(i)虑万物理量之数,(ii)天气之论,决于付时与域,(iii)论当为用户有用之息。 为之数,合三编码器,以数占图,以候元数。 引入天信息(晴和雨),分明说有用的信息。 我行自与人工评。 结果表明,吾形于信息性,与基线为最。 明我代码数。', 'hi': 'मौसम संबंधी सिमुलेशन से मौसम-पूर्वानुमान टिप्पणियां उत्पन्न करने के कार्य में निम्नलिखित आवश्यकताएं हैं: (i) विभिन्न भौतिक मात्राओं के लिए संख्यात्मक मूल्यों में परिवर्तन पर विचार करने की आवश्यकता है, (ii) मौसम की टिप्पणियां वितरण समय और क्षेत्र की जानकारी पर निर्भर होनी चाहिए, और (iii) टिप्पणियों को उपयोगकर्ताओं के लिए उपयोगी जानकारी प्रदान करनी चाहिए। इन आवश्यकताओं को पूरा करने के लिए, हम एक डेटा-टू-टेक्स्ट मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जिसमें संख्यात्मक पूर्वानुमान मानचित्र, अवलोकन डेटा और मेटा-डेटा के लिए तीन प्रकार के एनकोडर शामिल हैं। हम मौसम की जानकारी का प्रतिनिधित्व करने वाले मौसम लेबल भी पेश करते हैं, जैसे कि धूप और बारिश, हमारे मॉडल के लिए स्पष्ट रूप से उपयोगी जानकारी का वर्णन करने के लिए। हमने स्वचालित और मानव मूल्यांकन किया। परिणामों से संकेत मिलता है कि हमारे मॉडल ने सूचनात्मकता के मामले में बेसलाइन के खिलाफ सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन किया। हम अपने कोड और डेटा को सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध कराते हैं।', 'ga': 'Tá na ceanglais seo a leanas ag baint leis an tasc a bhaineann le tráchtanna réamhaisnéise aimsire a ghiniúint ó insamhaltaí meitéareolaíochta: (i) ní mór athruithe ar luachanna uimhriúla do chainníochtaí fisiceacha éagsúla a chur san áireamh, (ii) ba cheart go mbeadh tuairimí aimsire ag brath ar am seachadta agus ar fhaisnéis achair, agus (iii) ba cheart go soláthródh na barúlacha faisnéis úsáideach d’úsáideoirí. Chun na ceanglais seo a chomhlíonadh, molaimid múnla sonraí go téacs a chuimsíonn trí chineál ionchódóra do léarscáileanna réamhaisnéise uimhriúla, sonraí breathnadóireachta agus meiteashonraí. Chomh maith leis sin tugaimid isteach lipéid aimsire a léiríonn faisnéis aimsire, cosúil le grianmhar agus báisteach, le go ndéanfaidh ár múnla cur síos soiléir ar fhaisnéis úsáideach. Rinneamar meastóireachtaí uathoibríocha agus daonna. Léiríonn na torthaí gurbh fhearr a d’fheidhmigh ár samhail i gcomparáid le bonnlínte i dtéarmaí faisnéiseachta. Cuirimid ár gcód agus sonraí ar fáil go poiblí.', 'hu': 'Az időjárás-előrejelzési megjegyzések meteorológiai szimulációkból történő készítésének feladata a következő követelményekkel rendelkezik: i. a különböző fizikai mennyiségekre vonatkozó numerikus értékek változásait figyelembe kell venni, ii. az időjárási megjegyzéseknek a szállítási időtől és a területtől függőnek kell lenniük, és iii. az észrevételeknek hasznos információkat kell nyújtaniuk a felhasználók számára. Ezeknek a követelményeknek való megfelelés érdekében olyan adat-szöveg modellt javasolunk, amely három típusú kódolót tartalmaz numerikus előrejelzési térképekhez, megfigyelési adatokhoz és metaadatokhoz. Az időjárási információkat, például a napsütést és az esőt ábrázoló időjárási címkéket is bemutatjuk modellünk, hogy kifejezetten leírják a hasznos információkat. Automatikus és emberi értékeléseket végeztünk. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy modellünk a legjobban teljesített a kiindulási vonalakkal szemben az információs képesség szempontjából. Kódunkat és adatainkat nyilvánosan hozzáférhetővé tesszük.', 'el': 'Το καθήκον της δημιουργίας σχολίων μετεωρολογικών προβλέψεων από μετεωρολογικές προσομοιώσεις έχει τις ακόλουθες απαιτήσεις: i) πρέπει να λαμβάνονται υπόψη οι μεταβολές των αριθμητικών τιμών για διάφορες φυσικές ποσότητες, ii) τα σχόλια καιρού θα πρέπει να εξαρτώνται από τον χρόνο παράδοσης και τις πληροφορίες περιοχής, και iii) τα σχόλια θα πρέπει να παρέχουν χρήσιμες πληροφορίες για τους χρήστες. Για να ικανοποιήσουμε αυτές τις απαιτήσεις, προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο δεδομένων-κειμένου που περιλαμβάνει τρεις τύπους κωδικοποιητών για αριθμητικούς χάρτες προβλέψεων, δεδομένα παρατήρησης και μετα-δεδομένα. Επίσης εισάγουμε ετικέτες καιρού που αντιπροσωπεύουν πληροφορίες καιρού, όπως ηλιοφάνεια και βροχή, για το μοντέλο μας να περιγράφει ρητά χρήσιμες πληροφορίες. Κάναμε αυτόματες και ανθρώπινες αξιολογήσεις. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας πέτυχε καλύτερα έναντι των βασικών γραμμών όσον αφορά την πληροφορικότητα. Κάνουμε τον κώδικα και τα δεδομένα μας δημόσια διαθέσιμα.', 'ka': 'მეტეროლოგიური სიმულაციებიდან მოსახულების კომენტრების შექმნის პარამეტრება აქვს:i) განსხვავებული ფიზიკური მნიშვნელობის ცვლილებების შესახებ, ii) მოსახულების კომენტრები უნდა იყოს მოსახულების დროზე და განზომილების ინფორმაციაზე დასა ჩვენ ამ შესაძლებლობისთვის გავაკეთებთ მონაცემების ტექსტის მოდელს, რომელიც სამი ტიპის კოდერები მრიცხველი პროგენტის კაპონტებისთვის, მონაცემების მონაცემებისთვის და მე ჩვენ ასევე მოვიყენებთ მოდგენების ნიშანები, რომლებიც მოდგენების ინფორმაციას, როგორიც სამყარო და დისხი, რომ ჩვენი მოდელის გამოსახულებით გამოსახულებელი ინ ჩვენ ავტომატური და ადამიანის განსაზღვრებას გავაკეთეთ. წარმოდგენები მინდომარებს, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი ინფორმატიფიკაციის განმავლობაში უფრო ძალიან გამოყენებულია. ჩვენ ჩვენი კოდის და მონაცემების ადგილურად ხელხსნავთ.', 'it': "Il compito di generare commenti sulle previsioni meteorologiche mediante simulazioni meteorologiche comporta i seguenti requisiti: i) le variazioni dei valori numerici per varie quantità fisiche devono essere prese in considerazione, ii) le osservazioni meteorologiche devono dipendere dai tempi di consegna e dalle informazioni sull'area e iii) le osservazioni dovrebbero fornire informazioni utili agli utenti. Per soddisfare questi requisiti, proponiamo un modello data-to-text che incorpora tre tipi di encoder per mappe di previsione numerica, dati di osservazione e meta-dati. Introducemo anche etichette meteo che rappresentano informazioni meteorologiche, come sole e pioggia, per il nostro modello per descrivere esplicitamente le informazioni utili. Abbiamo condotto valutazioni automatiche e umane. I risultati indicano che il nostro modello ha funzionato meglio rispetto alle linee di base in termini di informatività. Rendiamo disponibili pubblicamente il nostro codice e i nostri dati.", 'mk': 'Задачата да се генерираат коментари за предвидување на времето од метеоролошките симулации има следните барања: (i) треба да се разгледаат промените во бројните вредности за различни физички количини, (ii) времето коментари треба да зависат од времето на достава и информациите за областа, и (iii) коментарите треба да обезбе За да ги исполниме овие барања, предложуваме модел од податоци до текст кој вклучува три видови кодери за бројни мапи на прогнози, податоци за набљудување и мета-податоци. We also introduce weather labels representing weather information, such as sunny and rain, for our model to explicitly describe useful information.  Правивме автоматски и човечки проценки. Резултатите покажуваат дека нашиот модел успеа најдобро во однос на основните линии во поглед на информативноста. Ги ставаме нашите кодови и податоци јавно достапни.', 'kk': 'Метеорологикалық симуляциялардан күн- жай таңбашаларын жасау тапсырмасы келесі қажеттері бар: i) түрлі физикалық сандардың сандарының өзгерістері, ii) күн- жай таңбашалары келтіру уақыты мен аумағынан тәуелді, iii) таңбашалар пайдаланушылардың пайд Бұл қажеттерді қарау үшін, біз санды таңдау карталары, наблюдение деректері және мета- деректері үш түрлі кодерлерді қосу үшін мәтін үлгісін қолданамыз. Мұндай-ақ, күн мен жаңбыр секілді, күн мен жаңбыр мәліметін көрсету үшін, моделіміздің пайдалы мәліметті таңдау үшін күн жаңалық жарлықтарын таңдап берем Біз автоматты және адамдардың оқиғаларын жасадық. Нәтижелер біздің үлгіміз мәліметтік түрде негізгі сызықтардан жақсы жұмыс істеді. Біз код мен деректерімізді жалпы жұмыс істейміз.', 'lt': 'Atliekant meteorologinius modeliavimus reikia pateikti meteorologinių prognozių pastabų: i) atsižvelgti į įvairių fizinių kiekių skaitmeninių verči ų pokyčius, ii) meteorologinės pastabos turėtų priklausyti nuo pristatymo laiko ir ploto informacijos ir iii) pastabos turėtų suteikti naudingą informaciją naudotojams. Kad atitiktume šiuos reikalavimus, siūlome duomenų model į tekstui, kuriame pateikiami trys skaitmeninių prognozių žemėlapių, stebėjimo duomenų ir metaduomenų kodai. Taip pat įvedame oro ženklus, kuriuose pateikiama oro informacija, pvz., saulė ir lietus, kad mūsų modelis aiškiai aprašytų naudingą informaciją. Mes atlikome automatinius ir žmogiškuosius vertinimus. Rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų modelis geriausiai pasiekė informacijos bazes. Mes viešai paskelbiame savo kodą ir duomenis.', 'ms': 'The task of generating weather-forecast comments from meteorological simulations has the following requirements: (i) the changes in numerical values for various physical quantities need to be considered, (ii) the weather comments should be dependent on delivery time and area information, and (iii) the comments should provide useful information for users.  Untuk memenuhi keperluan ini, kami cadangkan model data-ke-teks yang mengandungi tiga jenis pengekod untuk peta ramalan nombor, data pengawasan, dan meta-data. Kami juga memperkenalkan label cuaca mewakili maklumat cuaca, seperti matahari dan hujan, untuk model kami untuk menjelaskan secara jelas maklumat berguna. Kami melakukan penilaian automatik dan manusia. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahawa model kita melakukan yang terbaik melawan garis dasar dalam terma informasi. Kami membuat kod dan data kami tersedia kepada masyarakat.', 'mt': 'Il-kompitu li jiġġenera kummenti tat-tbassir tat-temp minn simulazzjonijiet meteoroloġi ċi għandu r-rekwiżiti li ġejjin: (i) il-bidliet fil-valuri numeriċi għal kwantitajiet fiżiċi varji jeħtieġ li jiġu kkunsidrati, (ii) il-kummenti tat-temp għandhom ikunu dipendenti fuq il-ħin tal-kunsinna u l-informazzjoni dwar iż-żona, u (iii) il-kummenti għandhom jipprovdu informazzjoni utli għall-utenti. Biex nissodisfaw dawn ir-rekwiżiti, nipproponu mudell ta’ dejta mat-test li jinkorpora tliet tipi ta’ kodifikaturi għal mapep numeriċi tat-tbassir, dejta ta’ osservazzjoni, u meta-dejta. Inintroduċu wkoll tikketti tat-temp li jirrappreżentaw informazzjoni dwar it-temp, bħax-xemx u x-xita, biex il-mudell tagħna jiddeskrivi espliċitament informazzjoni utli. Saru evalwazzjonijiet awtomatiċi u umani. Ir-riżultati jindikaw li l-mudell tagħna wettaq bl-aħjar mod kontra l-linji bażi f’termini ta’ informazzjoni. Aħna nagħmlu l-kodiċi u d-dejta tagħna disponibbli għall-pubbliku.', 'ml': 'കാലാവസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ മുന്നില്\u200d നിന്നും കാലാവസ്ഥാന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രവൃത്തി താഴെയുള്ള ആവശ്യങ്ങളുണ്ട്: (i) വ്യത്യസ്തികമായ വില മൂല്യങ്ങളുടെ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d വിചാരിക്കേ To meet these requirements, we propose a data-to-text model that incorporates three types of encoders for numerical forecast maps, observation data, and meta-data.  കാലാവസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങളെ പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്ന കാലാവസ്ഥ ലേബലുകളും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. സൂര്യനും മഴയും പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ നമ്മള്\u200d സ്വയം മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തി. അതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വിവരമില്ലാത്ത കാര്യത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ബേസ്റ്റ് ലൈനുകള്\u200dക്കെതിരായി ഏറ്റവും നല നമ്മുടെ കോഡും വിവരങ്ങളും പ്രസിദ്ധമാക്കുന്നു.', 'mn': 'meteorological simulations-аас цаг агаарын төсөөлөлөл дэвшүүлэх үйлдэл нь дараагийн шаардлагатай: Эдгээр шаардлагуудыг удирдахын тулд бид тоон хэлбэрийн газрын зураг, ажиглах өгөгдлийн болон мета-өгөгдлийн гурван төрлийн кодер бүрдүүлэх өгөгдлийн зураг болон текст загварын загварыг санал болно. Мөн бид цаг агаарын жагсаалт нь цаг агаарын мэдээллийг илэрхийлж, нар болон бороон зэрэг, загварын загвар ашигтай мэдээллийг тодорхой тайлбарлах хэрэгтэй. Бид автоматик болон хүн төрөлхтний үнэлгээг хийсэн. Үүний үр дүнд бидний загвар мэдээллийн талаар суурь шугамын эсрэг хамгийн сайн үйлдвэрлэсэн гэдгийг харуулдаг. Бид өөрсдийн код, өгөгдлийг олон нийтэд ашиглаж чадна.', 'no': 'Oppgåva for å laga værforhåndsvising av kommentarar frå meteorologiske simulasjonar har følgjande krev: i) endringane i numeriske verdiar for ulike fysiske mengdar må vera anslått, ii) værkommentarar bør vera avhengig av informasjon om tid og område, og iii) kommentarar bør gje nyttig informasjon for brukarar. For å fullføra desse kreftene, foreslår vi eit data- til- tekstmodell som inkluderer tre typar kodar for numeriske foreslådkarter, observasjonsdata og metadata. Vi introduserer også væretikettar som representerer værinformasjon, slik som sol og regn, for modellen vårt å beskrive nyttig informasjon. Vi conducterte automatiske og menneske evalueringar. Resultatet tyder på at modellen vårt utførte best mot baselinjer i formasjonen. Vi gjer våre kode og data tilgjengeleg offentlig.', 'pl': 'Zadanie generowania komentarzy dotyczących prognozy pogody z symulacji meteorologicznych ma następujące wymagania: (i) należy uwzględnić zmiany wartości liczbowych dla różnych wielkości fizycznych, (ii) komentarze pogodowe powinny być uzależnione od czasu dostawy i informacji o obszarze oraz (iii) komentarze powinny dostarczać użytecznych informacji dla użytkowników. Aby spełnić te wymagania, proponujemy model danych-tekstowy, który obejmuje trzy typy koderów do numerycznych map prognozy, danych obserwacyjnych i metadanych. Wprowadzamy również etykiety pogodowe reprezentujące informacje o pogodzie, takie jak słońce i deszcz, aby nasz model wyraźnie opisał przydatne informacje. Przeprowadziliśmy automatyczne i ludzkie oceny. Wyniki wskazują, że nasz model najlepiej sprawdził się w stosunku do linii bazowych pod względem informacyjności. Nasz kod i dane udostępniamy publicznie.', 'ro': 'Sarcina de a genera observații privind prognoza meteo din simulările meteorologice are următoarele cerințe: (i) trebuie luate în considerare modificările valorilor numerice pentru diferite cantități fizice, (ii) observațiile meteorologice ar trebui să depindă de timpul de livrare și informațiile privind zona și (iii) observațiile ar trebui să furnizeze informații utile utilizatorilor. Pentru a satisface aceste cerințe, propunem un model de date-text care încorporează trei tipuri de encodere pentru hărți de prognoză numerică, date de observare și meta-date. De asemenea, introducem etichete meteo care reprezintă informații meteorologice, cum ar fi soare și ploaie, pentru ca modelul nostru să descrie în mod explicit informații utile. Am efectuat evaluări automate şi umane. Rezultatele indică faptul că modelul nostru a performat cel mai bine în raport cu liniile de bază din punct de vedere informativ. Facem codul și datele noastre disponibile public.', 'sr': 'Zadatak stvaranja komentara za predviđenje vremena iz meteoroloških simulacija ima sljedeće zahteve: i) potrebno je razmotriti promjene brojnih vrijednosti za različite fizičke količine, ii) komentari vremena trebali bi biti ovisni o informacijama o dostavljanju vremena i području, i iii) komentari bi trebali pružiti korisne informacije za korisnike. Za ispunjavanje tih zahteva predlažemo model podataka do teksta koji uključuje tri vrste kodera za brojne karte predviđenja, podatke o promatranju i metapodatke. Takoðe predstavljamo i etikete vremena koje predstavljaju informacije o vremenu, kao što su sunce i kiša, da bi naš model jasno opisao korisne informacije. Provodili smo automatske i ljudske procjene. Rezultati ukazuju na to da je naš model najbolje izvršio protiv osnovnih linija u smislu informativnosti. Objavljujemo naš kod i podatke.', 'si': 'weather-forecast Comment මේ අවශ්\u200dයය සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, අපි දත්ත තියෙන්න පාළුවෙන් පෙළුවන් මොඩේල් එකක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මක සූ අපි ඒවගේම වාතාවේ ලේබෙල් පෙනුම් කරනවා කාලයේ තොරතුරු පෙනුම් කරනවා, හරියට සූර්යය සහ වයින්, අපේ මොඩේල් ප්\u200dරක අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවක් සහ මිනිස්සු විශ්ලේෂණය කළා. ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර අපි අපේ කෝඩ් සහ දත්ත සාමාජික විදියට ලැබෙනවා.', 'sv': 'Uppgiften att generera väderprognoskommentarer från meteorologiska simuleringar har följande krav: i) förändringarna i numeriska värden för olika fysiska mängder måste beaktas, ii) väderkommentarerna bör vara beroende av leveranstid och information om området, och iii) kommentarerna bör ge användbar information för användarna. För att uppfylla dessa krav föreslår vi en data-till-text modell som innehåller tre typer av kodare för numeriska prognoskartor, observationsdata och meta-data. Vi introducerar även väderetiketter som representerar väderinformation, såsom sol och regn, så att vår modell uttryckligen beskriver användbar information. Vi gjorde automatiska och mänskliga utvärderingar. Resultaten indikerar att vår modell presterade bäst mot baselines vad gäller informativitet. Vi gör vår kod och data offentligt tillgängliga.', 'so': 'Shaqo ka soo saarista commentarada cimilada ka soo saara sawirada meteorologiga waxay leedahay shuruudaha soo socda: (i) isbedelka qiimaha tirada ah ee qiimaha jimicsiga kala duduwan waa in la fikiraa, (ii) commentarada cimiladu waxay ku xiran tahay mid ku saabsan dhalashada wakhtiga iyo macluumaadka soonaha, iii) commentaraduna waa in ay macluumaad faa’iido leh u bixiyaan isticmaalayaasha. Si aad u buuxiso shuruudahan, waxaan u soo jeedaynaa model macluumaad-u-qoraal ah oo ku qoran saddex nooc oo codcod ah oo u qoran kartaha hortagga, data observation, iyo data meta-data. We also introduce weather labels representing weather information, such as sunny and rain, for our model to explicitly describe useful information.  Waxaannu sameeynay qiimeynta maamulka ah iyo dadka. Midhaha resultadu waxay ka muuqataa in modellkayagu uu si wanaagsan uga sameeyay qoraalka aasaasiga ah oo ku saabsan aqoonta. Waxaynu si bayaan ah ugu sameynaa codsigeena iyo macluumaadyadeena.', 'ur': 'موتورلوژیکی سیمولوژیکوں سے ہوا-پیش آنے والی کمٹروں کی پیدائش کی کوشش کے لئے نیچے کی ضرورت ہیں: (i) مختلف فیزیکی مقداروں کے لئے مختلف مقداروں کی بدلنے کی ضرورت ہے, (ii) هوا کی کمٹروں کو پہنچانے کے وقت اور منطقه معلومات پر اعتبار رکھنا چاہیے اور (iii) کمٹروں کو کارساز کے لئے یہ ضرورت پوری کرنے کے لئے، ہم ایک ڈیٹ پر متکس موڈل کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو شماری پیشنهاد نقشه، نظارت ڈیٹ اور مٹا-ڈیٹ کے لئے تین طرح کا انکوڈر شامل کرتا ہے. ہم نے ہوا لیبل بھی معلوم کر دیتے ہیں جو هوا معلومات کی نمایش کرتی ہیں، جیسے سورج اور بارش، ہمارے مدل کے لئے مفید معلومات کی توصیح کرتی ہے۔ ہم نے آٹوٹی اور انسان کی ارزش کی۔ نتیجے نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ہماری مدل معلومات کے مطابق بنیاس لینوں کے خلاف بہترین عمل کرتی ہے۔ ہم اپنے کڈ اور ڈیٹا کو ظاہر طور پر موجود بناتے ہیں۔', 'ta': 'வானிலை- முன்னோட்டு குறிப்புரைகளை உருவாக்கும் பணி பின்வரும் தேவைகள் உள்ளது: (i) பல இயல்பான அளவுகளுக்கான எண்ணிக்கை மதிப்புகளின் மாற்றங்கள் கருத வேண்டும் , (ii) வானிலை குறிப்புரைகள் வ இந்த விருப்பங்களை நிறைவேற்ற, நாம் மூன்று வகையான குறியீட்டுகளை சேர்க்கும் தகவல் முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். நாம் வானிலை தகவல்களை பிரதிநிர்ணயிக்கும் வானிலை சிட்டைகளை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம், சூரியன் மற்றும் மழை, வெளிப்படையாக பயனுள நாங்கள் தானாகவே மற்றும் மனித மதிப்புகளை செய்தோம். முடிவு நாம் எங்கள் குறியீடு மற்றும் தகவல் பொதுவாக கிடைக்கும்.', 'uz': "Meteorologik simuliyatlaridan obʼektlarni yaratish vazifasi quyidagi keraklari bor: (i) har xil qiymatlar uchun oʻzgarishlarni koʻrsatish kerak, (ii) weather izohi vaqt va maydon maʼlumotiga таваккал қилмоғи лозим, va (iii) izohlar foydalanuvchiga foydalanish kerak maʼlumotini koʻrsatilishi kerak. Bu takliflarni topish uchun biz raqamli oldinga kartonlar, taʼminlovchi maʼlumot va meta-maʼlumot uchun uch tur kodlash usulini yaratishni talab qilamiz. Biz ham shamol hafta maʼlumotni, masalan qora va باران kabi ob-havo yorliqlarini ko'rganamiz. Biz foydali maʼlumotni aniqlash modelimiz uchun. Biz avtomatik va inson qiymatlarini bajardik. Natijalar haqida maʼlumot yordamida modelmiz asosiy satrlaridan eng yaxshi bajaradi. Biz kodlash va maʼlumotlarimizni faqat mavjud qilamiz.", 'vi': 'Nhiệm vụ tạo ra bình luận dự báo thời tiết từ các giả lập thời tiết có những yêu cầu như sau đây: i) việc thay đổi giá trị số lượng cho nhiều lượng vật lý khác nhau cần phải được cân nhắc, Để đáp ứng yêu cầu này, chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình dữ liệu-văn bản chứa ba loại mã hóa cho bản đồ dự báo số, dữ liệu quan sát, và các meta-dữ liệu. Chúng tôi cũng đưa ra các nhãn thời tiết đại diện cho thông tin thời tiết, như nắng và mưa, để mô hình của chúng tôi miêu tả rõ thông tin hữu ích. Chúng tôi đã tiến hành đánh giá tự động. Kết quả cho thấy mô hình của chúng tôi làm việc tốt nhất với những đường cơ bản về mặt tin tức. Chúng tôi công khai mã và dữ liệu của chúng tôi.', 'hr': 'Zapovijed stvaranja komentara za prognozu vremena iz meteoroloških simulacija ima sljedeće zahtjeve: i) potrebno je razmotriti promjene brojnih vrijednosti za različite fizičke količine, ii) komentari za vrijeme moraju biti ovisni o informacijama o dostavljanju vremena i području i iii) komentari bi trebali pružiti korisne informacije za korisnike. Za ispunjavanje tih zahtjeva predlažemo model podataka do teksta koji uključuje tri vrste kodera za brojne karte predviđenja, podatke o promatranju i metapodatke. Također predstavljamo i oznake vremena koji predstavljaju informacije o vremenu, poput sunca i kiše, kako bi naš model jasno opisao korisne informacije. Provodili smo automatske i ljudske procjene. Rezultati ukazuju na to da je naš model najbolje izvršio protiv početnih linija u smislu informativnosti. Objavljujemo naš kod i podatke.', 'da': 'Opgaven med at udarbejde vejrudsigtsbemærkninger fra meteorologiske simuleringer har følgende krav: i) ændringerne i numeriske værdier for forskellige fysiske mængder skal tages i betragtning, ii) vejrudsigtsbemærkningerne bør være afhængige af leveringstid og oplysninger om området, og iii) bemærkningerne bør give brugerne nyttige oplysninger. For at opfylde disse krav foreslår vi en data-til-tekst model, der omfatter tre typer kodere til numeriske prognosekort, observationsdata og meta-data. Vi introducerer også vejrmærker, der repræsenterer vejrudsigter, såsom sol og regn, så vores model udtrykkeligt kan beskrive nyttige oplysninger. Vi foretog automatiske og menneskelige evalueringer. Resultaterne indikerer, at vores model klarede sig bedst i forhold til baselines med hensyn til informativitet. Vi gør vores kode og data offentligt tilgængelige.', 'bg': 'Задачата за генериране на коментари за прогнозата на времето от метеорологични симулации има следните изисквания: i) трябва да се вземат предвид промените в цифровите стойности за различни физически количества, ii) коментарите за времето за доставка и информацията за района, и iii) коментарите трябва да предоставят полезна информация за потребителите. За да отговорим на тези изисквания, предлагаме модел от данни към текст, който включва три типа кодери за цифрови прогнози карти, данни за наблюдение и метаданни. Също така въвеждаме етикети за времето, представящи информация за времето, като слънчево и дъжд, за да може моделът ни изрично да опише полезна информация. Проведохме автоматични и човешки оценки. Резултатите показват, че нашият модел се представи най-добре спрямо базовите линии по отношение на информативността. Ние правим нашия код и данни публично достъпни.', 'nl': 'De taak van het genereren van opmerkingen over weersvoorspellingen uit meteorologische simulaties heeft de volgende vereisten: i) de veranderingen in numerieke waarden voor verschillende fysieke grootheden moeten in aanmerking worden genomen, (ii) de weersopmerkingen moeten afhankelijk zijn van de levertijd en de gebiedsinformatie, en iii) de opmerkingen moeten nuttige informatie voor de gebruikers verstrekken. Om aan deze eisen te voldoen, stellen we een data-to-text model voor dat drie typen encoders bevat voor numerieke voorspellingskaarten, observatiegegevens en metadata. We introduceren ook weerlabels die weerinformatie weergeven, zoals zon en regen, zodat ons model expliciet nuttige informatie beschrijft. We hebben automatische en menselijke evaluaties uitgevoerd. De resultaten geven aan dat ons model het best presteerde ten opzichte van baselines in termen van informatiekracht. We maken onze code en gegevens openbaar beschikbaar.', 'id': 'Tugas untuk menghasilkan komentar-komentar perkiraan cuaca dari simulasi meteorologi memiliki keperluan berikut: (i) perubahan nilai numerik untuk berbagai jumlah fisik perlu dipertimbangkan, (ii) komentar cuaca harus tergantung pada waktu pengiriman dan informasi daerah, dan (iii) komentar harus menyediakan informasi berguna bagi pengguna. Untuk memenuhi keperluan ini, kami mengusulkan model data-ke-teks yang mengandung tiga jenis pengekoder untuk peta progresi numerik, data pengawasan, dan meta-data. Kami juga memperkenalkan label cuaca yang mewakili informasi cuaca, seperti matahari dan hujan, untuk model kami menjelaskan secara eksplicit informasi berguna. Kami melakukan evaluasi otomatis dan manusia. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahwa model kita berhasil terbaik melawan garis dasar dalam hal informasi. Kami membuat kode dan data kami tersedia publik.', 'ko': '기상 시뮬레이션에서 일기예보 주석을 생성하는 작업은 다음과 같은 요구가 있다. (i) 각종 물리량의 수치 변화를 고려해야 하고, (ii) 일기 주석은 교부 시간과 지역 정보, 그리고 (iii) 주석은 사용자에게 유용한 정보를 제공해야 한다.이러한 요구를 만족시키기 위해 우리는 데이터부터 텍스트 모델까지 세 가지 유형의 인코더를 포함하여 수치 예보 지도, 관측 데이터와 원 데이터에 사용한다.우리는 또한 날씨 정보를 나타내는 날씨 라벨, 예를 들어 맑은 날과 비가 오는 것을 도입하여 우리의 모델이 유용한 정보를 명확하게 묘사하도록 했다.우리는 자동과 인공 평가를 진행했다.그 결과 우리 모델은 정보량 면에서 기선보다 가장 잘 나타난다.우리는 우리의 코드와 데이터를 공개한다.', 'de': 'Die Aufgabe, Wettervorhersagekommentare aus meteorologischen Simulationen zu generieren, hat folgende Anforderungen: (i) die Änderungen der numerischen Werte für verschiedene physikalische Größen müssen berücksichtigt werden, (ii) die Wetterkommentare sollten von Lieferzeiten und Flächeninformationen abhängen und (iii) die Kommentare sollten nützliche Informationen für die Benutzer liefern. Um diesen Anforderungen gerecht zu werden, schlagen wir ein Daten-zu-Text-Modell vor, das drei Arten von Encodern für numerische Vorhersagekarten, Beobachtungsdaten und Metadaten umfasst. Wir führen auch Wetteretiketten ein, die Wetterinformationen wie Sonne und Regen darstellen, damit unser Modell nützliche Informationen explizit beschreibt. Wir haben automatische und menschliche Bewertungen durchgeführt. Die Ergebnisse deuten darauf hin, dass unser Modell hinsichtlich der Informativität gegenüber Baselines am besten abschneidet. Wir stellen unseren Code und unsere Daten öffentlich zur Verfügung.', 'sw': 'Kazi ya kutengeneza maoni ya matarajio ya hali ya hewa kutoka kwa simulizi za hali ya hewa ina hitaji ifuatayo: (i) mabadiliko ya thamani kadhaa kwa viwango vya kimwili yanapaswa kuchukuliwa, (ii) maoni ya hali ya hewa yanapaswa kutegemea wakati na taarifa za maeneo, na (iii) maoni yanapaswa kutoa taarifa yenye manufaa kwa watumiaji. Ili kukutana na mahitaji haya, tunapendekeza mtindo wa taarifa hadi ujumbe ambao unajumuisha aina tatu ya kodi kwa ajili ya ramani za utabiri, taarifa za uchunguzi na taarifa za meta. Pia tunaonyesha alama za hewa zinazowakilisha taarifa za hali ya hewa, kama vile jua na mvua, kwa mfano wetu wa kuelezea taarifa zinazofaa wazi. Tulifanya utafiti wa kibinadamu. Matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa model yetu ilifanya vizuri dhidi ya misingi ya msingi kwa sababu ya taarifa. Tunafanya sheria na taarifa zetu kwa uwazi.', 'tr': 'Meteorolojik simulasyonlardan howa-öňünden töwürlemek töwürleriniň görevi aşağıdaky şartlary bar: Bu şartlary ýerine ýetirmek üçin, sayyp öňden geçirmek mapalary, gözleme maglumaty we meta-maglumaty üçin üç tür kodeçi modelini teklip edip görýäris. Biz hem howa etiketlerini howa maglumaty ýaly güneş we ýagşy ýagyş ýaly görkezilýän etiketlerimizi möhüm maglumaty tassyklamak üçin guruldyrys. Biz awtomatik we ynsan deňleşmelerini etdik. netijeler biziň nusgamyzyň informatiýatlyk şeklinde üýtgeşik hatlaryň üstünde has gowy gazandygyny görkezýär. Biz öz kodymyzy we maglumatlarymyzy publika mejbur edip bilýäris.', 'sq': 'Detyra e krijimit të komenteve të parashikimit të motit nga simulimet meteorologjike ka kërkesat që vijnë: (i) ndryshimet në vlerat numerike për sasi të ndryshme fizike duhet të konsiderohen, (ii) komentet e motit duhet të varen nga koha e dorëzimit dhe nga informacioni i zonës dhe (iii) komentet duhet të ofrojnë informacion të dobishëm për përdoruesit. To meet these requirements, we propose a data-to-text model that incorporates three types of encoders for numerical forecast maps, observation data, and meta-data.  Ne gjithashtu paraqesim etiketa të motit që përfaqësojnë informacionin e motit, të tillë si dielli dhe shiu, për modelin tonë që të përshkruajë eksplicitisht informacionin e dobishëm. Ne kryem vlerësime automatike dhe njerëzore. Rezultatet tregojnë se modeli ynë bëri më të mirë kundër linjave bazë lidhur me informacionalitetin. Ne e bëjmë kodin dhe të dhënat tona të disponueshme publikisht.', 'am': 'የመድረክ ትእዛዝ ከሜትዮሎጂካዊ ምሳሌዎችን በመፍጠር ላይ የሚታየው ሥርዓት አለባቸው:(i) ለብዙ አካባቢ ክምር የተደረገው ለውጥ እንዲያስፈልጋል, (ii) የውይይይት ማስታወቂያ ሰዓት እና የአካባቢ መረጃ በመጠቀም ላይ እንዲታመነ ይገባዋል፡፡ እነዚህን ፈቃድ ለመገናኘት፣ ሦስት ዓይነት የፊደል ክዳቶችን ለቁጥር ማረፊያ፣ ማያየት ዳታ እና ማተሚያ ዳታ የሚያሳልፍ የዳታ-ወደ-ጽሑፍ ሞዴል እናሳልጋለን፡፡ የባሕር መረጃዎችን እንደሚያሳዩ የweather ምልክቶች፣ እንደ ፀሐይ እና ዝናብ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ አውቶማቲካዊ እና የሰው ምርጫዎች አደረግን ። ፍጥረቶቹ ማስታወቂያው እንደሆነ ሞዴላያችን በመስመር ላይ የተሻለ ነው፡፡ የኮድራችንን እና ዳራዎችን በግልጽ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'The task of generating weather-forecast comments from meteorological simulations has the following requirements: (i) the changes in numerical values for various physical quantities need to be considered, (ii) the weather comments should be dependent on delivery time and area information, and (iii) the comments should provide useful information for users.  Այս պահանջներին բավարարելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք տվյալներ տեքստի մոդել, որը ներառում է թվային կանխատեսումների քարտեզների, հետազոտության տվյալների և մետատվյալների երեք տեսակ կոդեր: Մենք նաև ներկայացնում ենք եղանակի պիտակներ, որոնք ներկայացնում են եղանակի տեղեկատվություն, ինչպիսիք են արևը և անձրևը, որպեսզի մեր մոդելը բացահայտորեն նկարագրի օգտակար տեղեկատվություն: Մենք ավտոմատիկ և մարդկային գնահատումներ կատարեցինք: Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը լավագույնը համեմատել է հիմնական գծերին ինֆորմատիվության առումով: Մենք հանրային հասանելի ենք դարձնում մեր կոդը և տվյալները:', 'az': 'Meteorolojik simulasyonlardan hava tədbirlərini təşkil etmək məqsədilə aşağıdaki şartları vardır: i) müxtəlif fizikal qiymətlərin sayısal qiymətlərin dəyişiklikləri təşkil edilməli, ii) hava tədbirlərinin təşkil vaxtı və alan məlumatına bağlı olması lazımdır, və iii) tədbirlərin istifadəçilər üçün faydalı məlumatla Bu şartları yerinə yetirmək üçün, sayısal tədbir kartları, gözləmə məlumatları və meta-məlumatları üçün üç tür kodlayıcı təklif edirik. Biz də hava etiketlərini, günəş və yağış kimi günəş və yağış məlumatlarını göstəririk, modelimiz faydalı məlumatları açıq-aydın tanımlamaq üçün. Biz avtomatik və insan değerlendirmələrini etdik. Sonuçların modellərimizin informativ şəkildə baselines ilə ən yaxşı əməl etdiyini göstərir. Biz kodumuz və məlumatlarımızı açıq-aşkar mövcud edirik.', 'bn': 'আবহাওয়া প্রাক্তন মন্তব্য তৈরি করার কাজ নিম্নলিখিত প্রয়োজন: (i) বিভিন্ন শারীরিক মানের সংখ্যার পরিবর্তন বিবেচনা করা দরকার, (ii) আবহাওয়া মন্তব্যের সময় ও এলাকা তথ্য প্রদানের উপর নির্ভর করা উচিত এবং (আই এই প্রয়োজনীয় প্রয়োজনের জন্য আমরা একটি ডাটা থেকে টেক্সট মডেল প্রস্তাব করি যা সংখ্যাগরিক মানচিত্র, পর্যবেক্ষণ তথ্য এবং মেটা ডাটার জন্য আমরা এছাড়াও আবহাওয়ার তথ্য প্রতিনিধিত্বিত আবহাওয়া লেবেলের পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই, যেমন সূর্য এবং বৃষ্টি, যেমন আমাদের মডেল পরিষ্কার আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয় এবং মানুষের মূল্য করেছি। ফলাফল নির্দেশ করে যে আমাদের মডেল তথ্যের বিরুদ্ধে ভালো করেছে। আমরা আমাদের কোড এবং তথ্য প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যাচ্ছি।', 'fa': 'وظیفه ایجاد توضیح\u200cهای پیش\u200cبینی هوا از شبیه\u200cسازی\u200cهای هوا نیاز دارد: (i) تغییرات در مقدار\u200cهای تعدادی برای مقدار\u200cهای فیزیکی که باید تحت نظر قرار گیرد; (ii) توضیح\u200cهای هوا باید بر اطلاعات زمان و منطقه\u200cهای تحویل بستگی دارند و (iii) توضیح\u200cها باید اطلا برای پایان این نیازها، ما یک مدل داده به متن پیشنهاد می کنیم که سه نوع رمز\u200cکننده برای نقشه\u200cهای پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای شماره، داده\u200cهای نظارت و داده\u200cهای متا را شامل می\u200cکند. ما همچنین برچسب\u200cهای هوا را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که اطلاعات هوا را نمایش می\u200cدهند، مثل خورشید و باران، برای مدل ما برای توضیح اطلاعات مفید توصیف کنیم. ما تحقیقات خودکار و انسان را انجام دادیم. نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما بهترین عملیات در مقابل خط\u200cهای بنیادی در مورد اطلاعات انجام داده است. ما کد و داده\u200cهامون را به طور عمومی در دسترس می\u200cدهیم.', 'bs': 'Zadatak stvaranja komentara za prognozu vremena iz meteoroloških simulacija ima sljedeće zahtjeve: i) potrebno je uzeti u obzir promjene brojnih vrijednosti za različite fizičke količine, ii) komentari za vrijeme treba zavisiti od informacija o dostavljanju vremena i području, i iii) komentari bi trebali pružiti korisne informacije za korisnike. Za ispunjavanje tih zahtjeva predlažemo model podataka do teksta koji uključuje tri vrste kodera za brojne karte predviđenja, podatke o promatranju i metapodatke. Također predstavljamo i etikete vremena koji predstavljaju informacije o vremenu, poput sunca i kiše, kako bi naš model jasno opisao korisne informacije. Provodili smo automatske i ljudske procjene. Rezultati ukazuju na to da je naš model najbolje izvršio protiv početnih linija u smislu informativnosti. Objavljujemo naš kod i podatke.', 'af': "Die taak van die genereer van weer-voorskou kommentaar van meteorologiese simulasies het die volgende benodighede: i) die veranderinge in numeriese waardes vir verskeie fisiese hoeveelheid moet beskou word, (ii) die weer kommentaar moet wees afhanklik op verskaf tyd en area inligting, en (iii) die kommentaar moet bruikbare inligting vir gebruikers verskaf word. Om hierdie benodighede te meet, voorstel ons 'n data- to- text model wat drie tipes enkoderers vir numeriese voorskou kaarte, observasie data en metadata inkorpreer. Ons introduseer ook weer etikette wat weer inligting verteenwoordig, soos sunny en reën, vir ons model om uitduidelik nuttige inligting te beskrywe. Ons het outomatiese en menslike evaluering gedoen. Die resultate beteken dat ons model die beste teen basisline in terms of informativeness uitgevoer het. Ons maak ons kode en data openlik beskikbaar.", 'cs': 'Úkol generování připomínek k předpovědi počasí z meteorologických simulací má následující požadavky: i) je třeba vzít v úvahu změny číselných hodnot různých fyzikálních veličin, (ii) poznámky k počasí by měly být závislé na dodací lhůtě a informacích o oblasti a iii) připomínky by měly poskytovat uživatelům užitečné informace. Pro splnění těchto požadavků navrhujeme data-to-text model, který obsahuje tři typy snímačů pro numerické mapy předpovědi, pozorovací data a metadata. Představujeme také označení počasí představující informace o počasí, jako je slunce a déšť, aby náš model explicitně popsal užitečné informace. Provedli jsme automatické a lidské hodnocení. Výsledky naznačují, že náš model vůči základním liniím vedl nejlépe z hlediska informativity. Náš kód a data zpřístupníme veřejně.', 'ca': "La tasca de generar comentaris de previsió meteorològica a partir de simulacions meteorològices té els següents requisits: i) cal tenir en compte els canvis en els valors numèrics de diverses quantitats físiques, ii) els comentaris meteorològics haurien de dependre del temps d'entrega i de la informació sobre la zona, i iii) els comentaris haurien de proporcionar informació útil als Per satisfer aquests requisits, proposem un model de dades a text que incorpora tres tipus de codificadors per a mapes numèrics de previsió, dades d'observació i metadades. També introduïm etiquetes meteorològiques que representen informació meteorològica, com el sol i la pluja, per a que el nostre model descrigui explícitament informació útil. Vam fer evaluacions automàtiques i humanes. Els resultats indican que el nostre model es va fer millor en comparació amb les línies de base en termes d'informativitat. We make our code and data publicly available.", 'et': 'Ilmaprognoosi kommentaaride koostamise ülesandeks meteoroloogiliste simulatsioonide põhjal on järgmised nõuded: i) tuleb kaaluda erinevate füüsikaliste koguste arvväärtuste muutusi, ii) ilmastiku kommentaarid peaksid sõltuma tarneajast ja piirkonnateabest ning iii) kommentaarid peaksid andma kasulikku teavet kasutajatele. Nende nõuete täitmiseks pakume välja andmete-teksti mudeli, mis sisaldab kolme tüüpi kodeerijaid numbriliste prognoosikaartide, vaatlusandmete ja metaandmete jaoks. Lisaks võtame kasutusele ilmamärgised, mis kujutavad ilmateavet, näiteks päikesepaistelist ja vihma, et meie mudel saaks selgesõnaliselt kirjeldada kasulikku teavet. Me tegime automaatseid ja inimlikke hinnanguid. Tulemused näitavad, et meie mudel oli informatiivsuse poolest parim võrreldes lähtejoontega. Me teeme oma koodi ja andmed avalikult kättesaadavaks.', 'fi': 'Sääennustekommenttien tuottamiseen meteorologisista simulaatioista liittyy seuraavat vaatimukset: i) eri fysikaalisten määrien numeeristen arvojen muutokset on otettava huomioon, ii) sääkommenttien on oltava riippuvaisia toimitusajasta ja aluetiedoista ja iii) kommenttien on annettava käyttäjille hyödyllistä tietoa. Näiden vaatimusten täyttämiseksi ehdotamme datasta tekstiin perustuvaa mallia, joka sisältää kolmentyyppisiä koodereita numeerisille ennustekartoille, havaintotiedoille ja metatiedoille. Esittelemme myös säätietoja, kuten aurinkoa ja sadetta, kuvaavia säätietoja malliimme, jotta hyödyllistä tietoa voidaan selkeästi kuvata. Teimme automaattisia ja inhimillisiä arviointeja. Tulokset viittaavat siihen, että mallimme suoriutui parhaiten tietokyvyn suhteen lähtökohtiin nähden. Annamme koodimme ja tietomme julkisesti saataville.', 'he': 'המשימה של ליצור תגובות מזג האוויר מהסימולציות מטאורולוגיות יש את הדרישות הבאות: (i) שינויים בערכים מספריים עבור כמויות פיזיות שונות צריכים להיחשב, (ii) תגובות מזג האוויר צריכות להיות תלויות בזמן המשלוח ומידע אזור, ולiii) ההערות צריכות לספק מידע שימושי למשתמשים. כדי לפגוש את הדרישות האלה, אנו מציעים מודל נתונים לטקסט שמכיל שלושה סוגים של קודדים למפות צפייה מספריות, נתונים צפייה, ומטה-נתונים. אנחנו גם מציגים תוויות מזג האוויר המייצגות מידע מזג האוויר, כמו שמש וגשם, כדי לדוגמא שלנו לתאר באופן ברור מידע שימושי. ביצענו ערכות אוטומטיות ואנושיות. The results indicate that our model performed best against baselines in terms of informativeness.  אנחנו פועלים את הקוד והנתונים שלנו פנויים לציבור.', 'sk': 'Naloga ustvarjanja komentarjev vremenskih napovedi na podlagi meteoroloških simulacij ima naslednje zahteve: (i) upoštevati je treba spremembe številčnih vrednosti za različne fizikalne količine, (ii) vremenske komentarje morajo biti odvisne od časa dostave in informacij o območju ter (iii) komentarji morajo biti uporabnikom koristne informacije. Za izpolnitev teh zahtev predlagamo model podatkov v besedilo, ki vključuje tri vrste kodirnikov za numerične napovedi zemljevidov, opazovalne podatke in metapodatke. Predstavljamo tudi vremenske oznake, ki predstavljajo vremenske informacije, kot sta sončno in dež, za naš model, ki izrecno opisuje koristne informacije. Opravili smo avtomatske in človeške ocene. Rezultati kažejo, da je bil naš model najboljši glede na osnovne vrednosti glede na informativnost. Našo kodo in podatke dajemo na voljo javnosti.', 'ha': "Kayyar wa mai ƙãga kalmar-kwantarwa daga misãlai na meteorologi yana da amfani da waɗannan: (i) canza masu amfani ga kima masu bin kidani na ƙidãya, (ii) umarnin kalma ɗin ya kamata a ƙayyade a kan amfani ga masu amfani da. Dõmin ka haɗi wannan umarni, muna buƙata wani misali-zuwa-matsayi da ke ƙunsa da nau'i uku-nau'i wa zanen gabatarwa, da data ga gani da meta-data. Tuna ƙara masa alama na kwanan wata da za'a gaya ma'abũcin kwanan wata, kamar solar da ruwa, don misãlai, ya bayyana misãlai ga abin da yake amfani da shi. Mun sami akan mutane da farat ɗaya. Mataimakin ta nuna cewa misalinmu ya sami mafiya kyau a kangara masu basu'in da ba'a sani ba. Munã samar da kodinmu da data bayani.", 'jv': 'task Sampeyan Jaringan langkung dianggap iki, kita supoyo model data-to-teks sing katong karo perusahaan karo koder kanggo mapan antar, data antar, lan meta-data . Awak dhéwé éngawe nambah alat-alat kanggo gambar informasi kapan ning awak, kaya isuk lan ulan, kanggo modèlé awak dhéwé nggawe informasi tambah apik dhéwé. Awak dhéwé éntuk asat karo hal-hal ujian. Rejaling ngomong nik akeh model sing ditambah sing luwih apik dhéwé kuwi tindakan informasi Awak dhéwé beraksi kode karo data publik gawe', 'bo': 'The task of generating weather-forecast comments from meteorological simulations has the following requirements: (i) the changes in numerical values for various physical quantities need to be considered, (ii) the weather comments should be dependent on delivery time and area information, and (iii) the comments should provide useful information for users. To meet these requirements, we propose a data-to-text model that incorporates three types of encoders for numerical forecast maps, observation data, and meta-data. We also introduce weather labels representing weather information, such as sunny and rain, for our model to explicitly describe useful information. ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། དབྱིབས་འབྲས་བ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གནས་ཚུལ་གང་ཟག་མཐོང་མི་ཡག་པོ་ཡོད་པ་ཤར་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཨང་དང་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྤྱད་པར་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'A phonetic model of non-native spoken word processing', 'es': 'Un modelo fonético de procesamiento de palabras habladas no nativas', 'ar': 'نموذج صوتي لمعالجة الكلمات المنطوقة بغير اللغة الأم', 'fr': 'Un modèle phonétique de traitement de texte parlé non natif', 'pt': 'Um modelo fonético de processamento de palavras não nativas', 'ja': '非ネイティブスポークンワードプロセッシングの音声モデル', 'hi': 'गैर-देशी बोले जाने वाले शब्द प्रसंस्करण का एक ध्वन्यात्मक मॉडल', 'zh': '非母语口语文字处理语音模样', 'ru': 'Фонетическая модель обработки неродного речевого слова', 'ga': 'Múnla foghraíochta de phróiseáil focal labhartha neamhdhúchais', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'A nem anyanyelvi beszélt szövegfeldolgozás fonetikai modellje', 'el': 'Ένα φωνητικό μοντέλο επεξεργασίας προφορικού λόγου που δεν είναι εγγενής', 'it': 'Un modello fonetico di elaborazione vocale non nativa', 'lt': 'fonetinis ne vietinio kalbėtojo žodžio apdorojimo modelis', 'mk': 'Name', 'kk': 'Тізбекті емес сөздерді өңдеу үлгісіName', 'ms': 'A phonetic model of non-native spoken word processing', 'mn': 'Үүнд биш байдаг үг үйлдвэрлэлийн фонетик загвар', 'ml': 'സ്വന്തം സംസാരിക്കാത്ത വാക്ക് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാനുള്ള ഫോണെറ്റിക് മോഡല്\u200d', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Model fonetyczny nienatywnego przetwarzania słowa mówionego', 'ro': 'Un model fonetic de procesare a cuvintelor vorbite non-native', 'sr': 'Fonetički model neodređenog obraæanja rijeèi', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Tusaale ahaan foonetka ee qof aan asal ahayn ka baaraandegista hadalka', 'sv': 'En fonetisk modell för icke-infödd talordbehandling', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'غیر منطقی بات پردازی کے فانونیک موڈل', 'mt': 'A phonetic model of non-native spoken word processing', 'uz': 'A phonetic model of non-native spoken word processing', 'vi': 'Mô hình ngữ âm của chế độ chữ không thổ dân', 'bg': 'Фонетичен модел на езикова обработка', 'hr': 'Fonetički model neodređenog obrađivanja riječi', 'da': 'En fonetisk model for ikke-indfødt talt ordbehandling', 'nl': 'Een fonetisch model van niet-native gesproken woordverwerking', 'de': 'Ein phonetisches Modell der nicht-nativen gesprochenen Wortverarbeitung', 'id': 'Model fonetik dari proses kata-kata bukan asli', 'fa': 'Name', 'ko': '비모국어 구어 처리의 음성 모형', 'sw': 'Mfano wa simu wa maneno yasiyoongea asili ya asili', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Խոսվող բառերի ոչ բնիկ վերլուծության ֆոնետիկ մոդելը', 'tr': 'Indiki geplenmeden söz işlemleriniň fonetik nusgasy', 'am': 'የአገራጆች ያልሆነው ቃል ተግባር የፎንቲክ ምሳሌ', 'az': 'Yerli deyil s√∂z iŇül…ôm…ôsinin fonetik modeli', 'bn': 'একটি ফোনেটিক মডেল বানানো শব্দ প্রক্রিয়ার', 'bs': 'Fonetički model neodređenog obrađivanja riječi', 'ca': 'Un model fonètic de processament de paraules parlades no natius', 'cs': 'Phonetický model zpracování mluveného slova, který není nativní', 'et': 'Mittemaailmse kõneleva teksti töötlemise foneetiline mudel', 'fi': 'Ei-syntyperäisen puhuttujen tekstinkäsittelyn foneettinen malli', 'sq': 'Një model fonetik i procesimit të fjalëve jo-natyrore', 'sk': 'Fonetični model nenavnega govorjenega besedila', 'he': 'A phonetic model of non-native spoken word processing', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis', 'jv': 'Name', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཆ་མི་སྤྲོད་པའི་གྲངས་ཀ་ལས་སྦྱོར་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཅིག'}
{'en': 'Non-native speakers show difficulties with spoken word processing. Many studies attribute these difficulties to imprecise phonological encoding of words in the lexical memory. We test an alternative hypothesis : that some of these difficulties can arise from the non-native speakers’ phonetic perception. We train a computational model of phonetic learning, which has no access to phonology, on either one or two languages. We first show that the model exhibits predictable behaviors on phone-level and word-level discrimination tasks. We then test the model on a spoken word processing task, showing that phonology may not be necessary to explain some of the word processing effects observed in non-native speakers. We run an additional analysis of the model’s lexical representation space, showing that the two training languages are not fully separated in that space, similarly to the languages of a bilingual human speaker.', 'ar': 'يظهر المتحدثون غير الناطقين بها صعوبات في معالجة الكلمات المنطوقة. تعزو العديد من الدراسات هذه الصعوبات إلى الترميز الصوتي غير الدقيق للكلمات في الذاكرة المعجمية. نقوم باختبار فرضية بديلة: أن بعض هذه الصعوبات يمكن أن تنشأ من الإدراك الصوتي لغير الناطقين بها. نحن ندرب نموذجًا حسابيًا للتعلم الصوتي ، والذي لا يمكنه الوصول إلى علم الأصوات ، في لغة واحدة أو لغتين. نوضح أولاً أن النموذج يعرض سلوكيات يمكن التنبؤ بها على مستوى الهاتف ومهام التمييز على مستوى الكلمات. ثم نختبر النموذج في مهمة معالجة كلمات منطوقة ، موضحين أن علم الأصوات قد لا يكون ضروريًا لشرح بعض تأثيرات معالجة الكلمات التي لوحظت في المتحدثين غير الأصليين. نجري تحليلًا إضافيًا لمساحة التمثيل المعجمي للنموذج ، موضحًا أن لغتي التدريب لم يتم فصلهما تمامًا في تلك المساحة ، على غرار لغات المتحدث البشري ثنائي اللغة.', 'es': 'Los hablantes no nativos muestran dificultades con el procesamiento de palabras habladas. Muchos estudios atribuyen estas dificultades a la codificación fonológica imprecisa de las palabras en la memoria léxica. Probamos una hipótesis alternativa: que algunas de estas dificultades pueden surgir de la percepción fonética de los hablantes no nativos. Entrenamos un modelo computacional de aprendizaje fonético, que no tiene acceso a la fonología, en uno o dos idiomas. Primero mostramos que el modelo exhibe comportamientos predecibles en las tareas de discriminación a nivel de teléfono y palabra. Luego probamos el modelo en una tarea de procesamiento de palabras habladas, demostrando que la fonología puede no ser necesaria para explicar algunos de los efectos del procesamiento de textos observados en hablantes no nativos. Realizamos un análisis adicional del espacio de representación léxica del modelo, que muestra que los dos idiomas de entrenamiento no están completamente separados en ese espacio, de manera similar a los idiomas de un hablante humano bilingüe.', 'pt': 'Os falantes não nativos apresentam dificuldades com o processamento de palavras faladas. Muitos estudos atribuem essas dificuldades à codificação fonológica imprecisa das palavras na memória lexical. Testamos uma hipótese alternativa: que algumas dessas dificuldades podem surgir da percepção fonética dos falantes não nativos. Treinamos um modelo computacional de aprendizagem fonética, que não tem acesso à fonologia, em uma ou duas línguas. Primeiro mostramos que o modelo exibe comportamentos previsíveis em tarefas de discriminação no nível do telefone e no nível da palavra. Em seguida, testamos o modelo em uma tarefa de processamento de palavras faladas, mostrando que a fonologia pode não ser necessária para explicar alguns dos efeitos de processamento de palavras observados em falantes não nativos. Realizamos uma análise adicional do espaço de representação lexical do modelo, mostrando que as duas línguas de treinamento não estão totalmente separadas nesse espaço, à semelhança das línguas de um falante humano bilíngue.', 'fr': "Les locuteurs non natifs présentent des difficultés avec le traitement de la parole. De nombreuses études attribuent ces difficultés à l'imprécision du codage phonologique des mots dans la mémoire lexicale. Nous testons une hypothèse alternative\xa0: certaines de ces difficultés peuvent provenir de la perception phonétique des locuteurs non natifs. Nous formons un modèle informatique d'apprentissage phonétique, qui n'a pas accès à la phonologie, sur une ou deux langues. Nous montrons d'abord que le modèle présente des comportements prévisibles sur les tâches de discrimination au niveau du téléphone et des mots. Nous testons ensuite le modèle sur une tâche de traitement de texte oral, montrant que la phonologie n'est peut-être pas nécessaire pour expliquer certains des effets de traitement de texte observés chez des locuteurs non natifs. Nous effectuons une analyse supplémentaire de l'espace de représentation lexicale du modèle, montrant que les deux langues d'apprentissage ne sont pas complètement séparées dans cet espace, tout comme les langues d'un locuteur humain bilingue.", 'zh': '非母语士难于口语文字处理。 多所研究归因于词汇记单词语音编码不精。 试一假设:其难自非母语人士语音感知。 一、二言训音者,无法访问语音学也。 吾先明其电话级、单词级以辨其行。 然后试形于口语文字处理事,明语音学可不必释于非母语人士之文字处理效也。 吾对模型之词汇,空为额外之分,明两练语言于其间不尽离,类于双语人之使用者。', 'ja': '非母語話者は、話し言葉処理に困難を示す。多くの研究では、これらの困難は語彙記憶における単語の音声学的符号化の不正確さに起因するとされている。私たちは別の仮説を検証します。これらの困難のいくつかは、非母語話者の音声認識から生じる可能性があるということです。1つまたは2つの言語で音声学にアクセスできない音声学習の計算モデルを訓練しますまず、このモデルが電話レベルとワードレベルの識別タスクで予測可能な動作を示すことを示します。次に、我々は、非母語話者で観察されたワープロ効果のいくつかを説明するために音声学が必要ではないかもしれないことを示す、話し言葉処理タスクでモデルをテストする。2つのトレーニング言語がその空間で完全に分離されていないことを示していますバイリンガルの人間の話者の言語と同様です', 'hi': 'गैर-देशी वक्ता बोले गए शब्द प्रसंस्करण के साथ कठिनाइयों को दिखाते हैं। कई अध्ययन इन कठिनाइयों को लेक्सिकल मेमोरी में शब्दों के ध्वन्यात्मक एन्कोडिंग को अभेद्य करने के लिए जिम्मेदार ठहराते हैं। हम एक वैकल्पिक परिकल्पना का परीक्षण करते हैं: कि इनमें से कुछ कठिनाइयां गैर-देशी वक्ताओं की ध्वन्यात्मक धारणा से उत्पन्न हो सकती हैं। हम ध्वन्यात्मक सीखने के एक कम्प्यूटेशनल मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं, जिसमें एक या दो भाषाओं पर फोनोलॉजी तक कोई पहुंच नहीं है। हम पहले दिखाते हैं कि मॉडल फोन-स्तर और शब्द-स्तर के भेदभाव कार्यों पर अनुमानित व्यवहार प्रदर्शित करता है। फिर हम एक बोले गए शब्द प्रसंस्करण कार्य पर मॉडल का परीक्षण करते हैं, यह दिखाते हुए कि गैर-देशी वक्ताओं में देखे गए कुछ शब्द प्रसंस्करण प्रभावों की व्याख्या करने के लिए फोनोलॉजी आवश्यक नहीं हो सकती है। हम मॉडल के लेक्सिकल प्रतिनिधित्व स्थान का एक अतिरिक्त विश्लेषण चलाते हैं, यह दिखाते हुए कि दो प्रशिक्षण भाषाएं उस स्थान में पूरी तरह से अलग नहीं हैं, इसी तरह एक द्विभाषी मानव वक्ता की भाषाओं के समान।', 'ru': 'Лица, не являющиеся носителями языка, сталкиваются с трудностями при обработке устных сообщений. Многие исследования связывают эти трудности с неточным фонологическим кодированием слов в лексической памяти. Мы проверяем альтернативную гипотезу: некоторые из этих трудностей могут возникнуть из-за фонетического восприятия носителей языка. Мы обучаем вычислительную модель фонетического обучения, которая не имеет доступа к фонологии, ни на одном, ни на двух языках. Сначала мы показываем, что модель демонстрирует предсказуемое поведение в задачах дискриминации на телефонном уровне и на уровне слов. Затем мы тестируем модель на устной текстовой обработке, показывая, что фонология может не быть необходимой для объяснения некоторых эффектов текстовой обработки, наблюдаемых у не носителей языка. Мы проводим дополнительный анализ лексического пространства представления модели, показывая, что два языка обучения не полностью разделены в этом пространстве, подобно языкам двуязычного человека.', 'ga': 'Léiríonn cainteoirí neamhdhúchasacha deacrachtaí le próiseáil focal labhartha. Cuireann go leor staidéar na deacrachtaí seo i leith ionchódú neamhchruinn fóineolaíoch na bhfocal sa chuimhne foclóireachta. Déanaimid tástáil ar hipitéis eile: gur féidir le cuid de na deacrachtaí seo eascairt as dearcadh foghraíochta na gcainteoirí neamhdhúchasacha. Cuirimid oiliúint ar mhúnla ríomhaireachtúil d’fhoghlaim foghraíochta, nach bhfuil fáil ar an bhfóineolaíocht, ar theanga amháin nó dhá theanga. Léirímid ar dtús go léiríonn an tsamhail iompraíochtaí intuartha ar thascanna idirdhealaithe gutháin agus leibhéal focal. Déanaimid tástáil ar an tsamhail ansin ar thasc próiseála focal labhartha, rud a thaispeánann go mb’fhéidir nach bhfuil gá leis an bhfóineolaíocht chun cuid de na héifeachtaí próiseála focal a breathnaíodh ar chainteoirí neamhdhúchasacha a mhíniú. Tá anailís bhreise á reáchtáil againn ar spás ionadaíochta foclóireachta an mhúnla, a thaispeánann nach bhfuil an dá theanga oiliúna deighilte go hiomlán sa spás sin, mar a chéile le teangacha cainteoir daonna dátheangach.', 'ka': 'არსებული სიტყვების გამოსახულებელი გამოსახულებს სიტყვების გამოსახულება. ბევრი კვლევები ატრიბუტირებენ ამ რთული სიტყვების ფონოლოგიური კოდირებას ლექსიკალური მეხსიერებაში. ჩვენ შევცვალობთ ალტენტრუმეტური ჰიპეტეზა: რომ ამ რთულეების ზოგიერთი შესაძლებელია ფონეტიკური აღმოჩენების ფონეტიკური აღმოჩენებიდან. ჩვენ ფონეტიკური სწავლების კომპუტაციონალური მოდელის გასწავლავთ, რომელიც ფონოლოგიას არ აქვს მიღება, ან ერთი ან ორი ენაზე. პირველად ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ვიჩვენებთ, რომ მოდელის გამოსახულებელი ქცევები ტელეფონის დონეზე და სიტყვის დონეზე დისკრიმინაციის მოქმედებში. შემდეგ ჩვენ მოდელს შევცვალოთ სიტყვების პროცესი რაოდენობაზე, რომელიც გამოჩვენება, რომ ფონოლოგია შეიძლება არ უნდა იყოს, რომ განახსნათ რამდენიმე სიტყვების პროც ჩვენ მოდელის ლექსიკალური გამოსახულების ადგილის დამატებული ანალიზაციას გავაკეთებთ, რომ ორი განახულების ენები არ უფრო გაყოფილი ამ ადგილიში, როგორც ორიენგური ადამიანის მუშაობელი ენების', 'el': 'Οι μη φυσικοί ομιλητές παρουσιάζουν δυσκολίες με την επεξεργασία προφορικού λόγου. Πολλές μελέτες αποδίδουν αυτές τις δυσκολίες στην ανακριβή φωνολογική κωδικοποίηση λέξεων στη λεξική μνήμη. Δοκιμάζουμε μια εναλλακτική υπόθεση: ότι ορισμένες από αυτές τις δυσκολίες μπορεί να προκύψουν από τη φωνητική αντίληψη των μη μητρικών ομιλητών. Εκπαιδεύουμε ένα υπολογιστικό μοντέλο φωνητικής μάθησης, το οποίο δεν έχει πρόσβαση στη φωνολογία, είτε σε μία είτε σε δύο γλώσσες. Αρχικά δείχνουμε ότι το μοντέλο παρουσιάζει προβλέψιμες συμπεριφορές σε επίπεδο τηλεφώνου και λέξεων. Στη συνέχεια, εξετάζουμε το μοντέλο σε μια εργασία επεξεργασίας προφορικού λόγου, δείχνοντας ότι η φωνολογία μπορεί να μην είναι απαραίτητη για να εξηγήσουμε ορισμένα από τα αποτελέσματα επεξεργασίας κειμένου που παρατηρούνται σε μη φυσικούς ομιλητές. Πραγματοποιούμε μια πρόσθετη ανάλυση του χώρου λεξικής αναπαράστασης του μοντέλου, δείχνοντας ότι οι δύο γλώσσες εκπαίδευσης δεν είναι πλήρως διαχωρισμένες σε αυτόν τον χώρο, όπως και οι γλώσσες ενός δίγλωσσου ανθρώπινου ομιλητή.', 'hu': 'A nem anyanyelvűek nehézségeket mutatnak a beszélt szövegfeldolgozással kapcsolatban. Sok tanulmány ezeket a nehézségeket a szavak pontatlan fonológiai kódolásának tulajdonítja a lexikai memóriában. Egy alternatív hipotézist tesztelünk: ezek közül néhány nehézség a nem anyanyelvűek fonetikai érzékeléséből eredhet. A fonetikai tanulás számítógépes modelljét képezzük, amely nem fér hozzá a fonológiához, egy vagy két nyelven. Először is megmutatjuk, hogy a modell kiszámítható viselkedést mutat a telefon- és szószintű diszkriminációs feladatokban. Ezután teszteljük a modellt beszélt szövegfeldolgozási feladat alapján, kimutatva, hogy a fonológia nem szükséges a nem anyanyelvű szövegfeldolgozási hatások egyes elmagyarázásához. További elemzést végzünk a modell lexikális reprezentációs térének, amely kimutatja, hogy a két oktatási nyelv ebben a térben nincs teljesen elválasztva, hasonlóan egy kétnyelvű emberi beszélő nyelvéhez.', 'it': "I non madrelingua mostrano difficoltà con l'elaborazione delle parole parlate. Molti studi attribuiscono queste difficoltà alla codifica fonologica imprecisa delle parole nella memoria lessicale. Testiamo un'ipotesi alternativa: che alcune di queste difficoltà possano derivare dalla percezione fonetica dei non madrelingua. Formiamo un modello computazionale di apprendimento fonetico, che non ha accesso alla fonologia, su una o due lingue. Per prima cosa mostriamo che il modello presenta comportamenti prevedibili a livello di telefono e attività di discriminazione a livello di parola. Testiamo quindi il modello su un compito di elaborazione vocale, dimostrando che la fonologia potrebbe non essere necessaria per spiegare alcuni degli effetti di elaborazione testi osservati nei non madrelingua. Eseguiamo un'ulteriore analisi dello spazio di rappresentazione lessicale del modello, mostrando che le due lingue di formazione non sono completamente separate in quello spazio, analogamente alle lingue di un parlante umano bilingue.", 'kk': 'Тізбекті сөздердің өңдеу қатесін көрсетеді. Көпшілік зерттеулер лексикалық жадындағы сөздердің фонологиялық кодтамасын дұрыстыру үшін осы мәселелерді таңдайды. Біз альтернативті гипотезаны тексереміз: бұл мәселелердің кейбір мәселелері жергілікті емес орындаушылардың фонетикалық түсініктерінен шығуға болады. Біз фонологияға қатынау мүмкіндігі жоқ, бір не екі тілде есептеу үлгісін үйренеміз. Біз біріншіден үлгі телефон деңгейінде және сөз деңгейіндегі дискриминациялық тапсырмаларды көрсетеді. Содан кейін сөздерді өңдеу тапсырмасының үлгісін тексереміз. Фонология жергілікті емес сөздерді өңдеу эффекттерін түсіндіру үшін қажетті болуы мүмкін. Біз үлгісінің лексикалық кеңістік орынын қосымша анализ істеп, екі оқыту тілдері осы орында толық бөлек емес, екі тілді адам сөйлейтінің тілдеріне ұқсас.', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കാത്ത സംസാരിക്കുന്നവര്\u200d വാക്ക് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d പ്രയാസമുണ്ട്. ഒരുപാട് പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d ഓര്\u200dമ്മയില്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ ഫോളോളജിക്കല്\u200d കോഡിങ്ങിനെ കുറിച്ച് കാണിക്കാന്\u200d  നമ്മള്\u200d മറ്റൊരു ഹൈപ്പിയറ്റീസിനെ പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു; ഈ പ്രയാസങ്ങളില്\u200d ചിലത് നാട്ടില്\u200d സംസാരിക്കാത്ത സംസാരികളുടെ ഫ ഫോണെറ്റിക് പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ കണക്കിട്ട മോഡല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ഫോണോളജിയില്\u200d ഒന്നോ രണ്ടോ ഭാഷകള നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് മോഡല്\u200d ഫോണ്\u200d നിലയിലും വാക്ക് നിലവിലുമുള്ള വ്യത്യാസമുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200d പിന്നീട് സംസാരിക്കുന്ന വാക്ക് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ജോലിയില്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. നാട്ടീവില്ലാത്ത സംസാരികള നമ്മള്\u200d മോഡലിന്റെ ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്ന സ്ഥലത്തിന്റെ കൂടുതല്\u200d അന്വേഷണം നടത്തുന്നു. ഈ രണ്ട് ട്രെയിനിങ്ങളുടെ ഭാഷകള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമാ', 'mk': "Неродните говорници покажуваат тешкотии во обработувањето на зборови. Многу студии ги припишуваат овие тешкотии за непрецизно кодирање на зборовите во лексичката меморија. Тестираме алтернативна хипотеза: дека некои од овие тешкотии можат да се појават од фонетската перцепција на неродните говорници. We train a computational model of phonetic learning, which has no access to phonology, on either one or two languages.  We first show that the model exhibits predictable behaviors on phone-level and word-level discrimination tasks.  Потоа го тестираме моделот на задачата за обработка на зборови, покажувајќи дека фонологијата можеби не е потребна за објаснување на некои од ефектите на обработка на зборови кои се забележани на неродните говорници. We run an additional analysis of the model's lexical representation space, showing that the two training languages are not fully separated in that space, similarly to the languages of a bilingual human speaker.", 'lt': "Non-native speakers show difficulties with spoken word processing.  Daugelis tyrimų rodo, kad šie sunkumai yra netikslūs žodžių tekstinėje atmintinėje fonologinis kodavimas. Bandome alternatyvią hipotezę: kad kai kurie iš šių sunkumų gali atsirasti dėl ne gimtinių kalbėtojų fonetinės suvokimo. Mokome kompiuterinį fonetinio mokymosi model į, kuris neturi galimybės naudotis fonologija, nei viena, nei dviem kalbomis. Pirmiausia rodome, kad modelis rodo nuspėjamą elgesį telefono ir žodžių lygio diskriminacijos užduotyse. We then test the model on a spoken word processing task, showing that phonology may not be necessary to explain some of the word processing effects observed in non-native speakers.  We run an additional analysis of the model's lexical representation space, showing that the two training languages are not fully separated in that space, similarly to the languages of a bilingual human speaker.", 'mn': 'Үүний биш орон захирагчид хэцүү хэцүү зүйлсийг харуулдаг. Ихэнх судалгаанууд энэ хэцүү зүйлсийг лексикийн санамж дээр фонологик хэлбэрүүдийг тодорхойлох боломжтой болгодог. Бид өөр өөр нэг таамаглалтыг шалгаж үзэж байна: эдгээр хэцүү зүйлсийн зарим хэцүү байдал нь орон нутгийн биш орчныг зохион ойлгох боломжтой. Бид нэг эсвэл хоёр хэл дээр фонологийг ашиглаж чадахгүй тооны загварыг суралцаж байна. Эхлээд бид загвар нь утасны түвшинд, үгний түвшинд ялгаварлах үйл ажиллагааг таамаглах боломжтой байдлыг үзүүлдэг. Дараа нь бид хэлсэн үг үйлдвэрлэлийн даалгаварын загварын загварыг шалгаж үзэж байгаа. Фонлоги нь орон нутгийн хэсгүүдэд харагдаж байгаа үг үйлдвэрлэлийн нөлөөг тайлбарлах хэрэггүй байх. Бид загварын лексикийн илэрхийллийн орон зайны нэмэлт шинжилгээг хийж, хоёр сургалтын хэл нь тэр орон зайд бүрэн ялгаагүй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Хоёр хэлний илтгэгчийн хэл шиг.', 'no': 'Ikkje-native talerar viser vanskeleghetar med tale ordhandtering. Mange studier attributtar desse vanskeleghetane for å impressera fonologisk koding av ord i leksiske minne. Vi testar eit alternativ hipotese: at nokre av desse vanskeleghetene kan oppstå frå den fonetiske oppfatninga av ikkje-native taler. Vi treng ein datamaskin modell for fonetisk læring, som har ingen tilgang til fonologikk, på anten eitt eller to språk. Vi viser først at modellen viser foregåande oppførsel på telefonnivå og ordnivådiskriminasjonar. Vi tester så modellen på eit praktisk ordhandsamingsoppgåve, viser at fonologien kanskje ikkje er nødvendig for å forklare nokre av ordhandsamingseffektane observerte i ikkje-native taler. Vi køyrer ei ekstra analyse av tekstplassen til modellen, som viser at dei to opplæringsspråka ikkje er fullstendig skilde i det rommet, slik som språka til eit bilingålt menneskelig taler.', 'ms': 'Penutur bukan asli menunjukkan kesulitan dengan pemprosesan perkataan bercakap. Many studies attribute these difficulties to imprecise phonological encoding of words in the lexical memory.  Kami menguji hipotesis alternatif: bahawa sebahagian daripada kesulitan ini boleh muncul dari perasaan fonetik pembicara bukan asli. We train a computational model of phonetic learning, which has no access to phonology, on either one or two languages.  Kami pertama-tama menunjukkan bahawa model menunjukkan perilaku yang dapat dijangka pada aras telefon dan tugas diskriminasi aras perkataan. Kemudian kita uji model pada tugas pemprosesan perkataan bercakap, menunjukkan bahawa fonologi mungkin tidak diperlukan untuk menjelaskan beberapa kesan pemprosesan perkataan yang dilihat dalam pembicara bukan asli. Kami menjalankan analisis tambahan ruang perwakilan leksikal model, menunjukkan bahawa dua bahasa latihan tidak sepenuhnya terpisah dalam ruang itu, sama seperti bahasa seorang pembicara manusia dua bahasa.', 'pl': 'Nienative speakers wykazują trudności z przetwarzaniem słowa mówionego. Wiele badań przypisuje te trudności nieprecyzyjnemu kodowaniu fonologicznemu słów w pamięci leksykalnej. Testujemy alternatywną hipotezę: że niektóre z tych trudności mogą wynikać z percepcji fonetycznej osób nienative speakerów. Szkolimy obliczeniowy model nauki fonetycznej, który nie ma dostępu do fonologii, na jednym lub dwóch językach. Najpierw pokazujemy, że model wykazuje przewidywalne zachowania w zakresie dyskryminacji na poziomie telefonu i słowa. Następnie testujemy model na zadaniu przetwarzania słowa mówionego, pokazując, że fonologia może nie być konieczna do wyjaśnienia niektórych efektów przetwarzania tekstu obserwowanych u osób nienative speakerów. Przeprowadzamy dodatkową analizę leksykalnej przestrzeni reprezentacyjnej modelu, pokazując, że dwa języki treningowe nie są w pełni oddzielone w tej przestrzeni, podobnie jak języki dwujęzycznego mówcy.', 'mt': 'Il-kelliema mhux nattivi juru diffikultajiet fl-ipproċessar tal-kliem mitkellm. Ħafna studji jattribwixxu dawn id-diffikultajiet biex l-ikkodifikar fonoloġiku tal-kliem fil-memorja lexika ma jkunx preċiż. Nittestjaw ipoteżi alternattiva: li xi wħud minn dawn id-diffikultajiet jistgħu jirriżultaw mill-perċezzjoni fonetika tal-kelliema mhux nattivi. Aħna nħarrġu mudell komputattiv tat-tagħlim fonetiku, li ma għandu l-ebda a ċċess għall-fonoloġija, fuq lingwa waħda jew żewġ lingwi. L-ewwel naraw li l-mudell juri mġibiet prevedibbli fuq kompiti ta’ diskriminazzjoni fil-livell tat-telefon u fil-livell tal-kliem. We then test the model on a spoken word processing task, showing that phonology may not be necessary to explain some of the word processing effects observed in non-native speakers.  Aħna nagħmlu analiżi addizzjonali tal-ispazju ta’ rappreżentazzjoni lexika tal-mudell, li turi li ż-żewġ lingwi ta’ taħriġ mhumiex separati kompletament f’dak l-ispazju, b’mod simili għall-lingwi ta’ kelliem uman billingwi.', 'sr': 'Nedomaći govornici pokazuju teškoće sa obrazovanjem reči. Mnogi studiji prikazuju ove poteškoće da neprihvate fonološki kodiranje reèi u leksičkom sećanju. Testiramo alternativnu hipotezu: da neki od ovih poteškoća mogu da izađu iz fonetičkog percepcije neprijateljskih govornika. Mi treniramo računalni model fonetičkog učenja, koji nema pristup fonologiji, na jednom ili dva jezika. Prvo pokazujemo da model pokazuje predvidljivo ponašanje na telefonskom nivou i diskriminacijskom zadatku na nivou riječi. Onda testiramo model na rečenom zadatku obrađivanja riječi, pokazujući da fonologija možda nije potrebna da objasnimo neke od efekta obrađivanja riječi koje su primijećene na neodrednim govornicima. Pokrenuli smo dodatnu analizu leksičkog prostora predstavljanja model a, pokazujući da se dva jezika obuke ne potpuno razdvajaju u tom prostoru, kao i jezika dvojezičkog ljudskog govornika.', 'so': 'Hadalka aan aheyn waxay muuqataa dhibaato ku jirta baaraandegista hadalka. Waxbarashada badanu waxay leeyihiin dhibaatooyinkaas si ay u hagaajiyaan codsiga qofka nololeedka ee xafiiska leksikada. Waxaynu tijaabinaynaa fikir kale, in dhibaatooyinkaas qaarkood ka soo bixi karo aragtida telefonetka ee dadka aan hooyo ahayn. We train a computational model of phonetic learning, which has no access to phonology, on either one or two languages.  Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu muujinnaa in modelku uu muujiyo tababar la sii sheegayo heerka telefoonka iyo shaqooyinka takoorista heerka. Markaas waxaynu tijaabinaynaa tilmaamaha shaqada baaritaanka hadalka, waxaynu tusnaynaa in foonolojiyada looma baahna in loo caddeeyo saameyn ka baaraandegista hadalka oo lagu arko hadalka aan dad kale ahayn. Analyo dheeraad ah ayaannu sameynaa goobta qaabilaadda noocyada, waxaynu tusnaynaa in labada luqadood waxbarashada a an dhammaan looga kala soocin meeshaas, sidoo kale luqadaha hadalka dadka labada luqadood oo kala hadla.', 'si': 'නොනැති ස්පීකර්ට් වචන පරීක්ෂණය සමග අමාරුවක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන්. ගොඩක් පරීක්ෂණය ලෙක්සිකල් මතකයෙන් වචන වචන සංකේතනය අවශ්\u200dයය කරන්න මේ අමාරුත්මක විශ්වාස කරනවා. අපි පරීක්ෂා කරන්නේ වෙනස් විශ්වාසිකයක්: මේ අමාරුවන් කිසිම අමාරුවක් නැති සිපිකරුවන්ගේ ෆෝනෙටික් අදහ අපි පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරමාණයක් කරනවා ෆෝනේටික් ඉගෙන ගණන් කරන්න, ඒකෙන් ෆෝනෝලෝජික් වලට ප්\u200dරවේශයක අපි මුලින්ම පෙන්වන්නේ මොඩේල් එක ප්\u200dරදේශයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් හැකියාවක් ෆෝන් ලේවල් සහ වචන ලේවල අපි පස්සේ කතා කරපු වචන පරික්ෂණා වැඩයක් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා, පෙන්වන්නේ නැති ස්පීකර්ටර් වචන පරික්ෂණාව සමහර වචන පරික අපි මොඩල් එකේ ලෙක්සිකල් ප්\u200dරතිශේෂණ අවස්ථානයේ අතර විශ්ලේෂණයක් කරන්නේ, පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරධාන භාෂා දෙකක් අතර අවස්ථානය', 'sv': 'Icke-infödda talare visar svårigheter med muntlig ordbehandling. Många studier tillskriver dessa svårigheter till en oklar fonologisk kodning av ord i lexikalminnet. Vi testar en alternativ hypotes: att vissa av dessa svårigheter kan uppstå från icke-infödda talares fonetiska uppfattning. Vi utbildar en beräkningsmodell för fonetiskt lärande, som inte har tillgång till fonologi, på antingen ett eller två språk. Vi visar först att modellen uppvisar förutsägbara beteenden på telefonnivå och ordnivå diskrimineringsuppgifter. Vi testar sedan modellen på en muntlig ordbehandlingsuppgift, vilket visar att fonologi kanske inte är nödvändig för att förklara några av de ordbehandlingseffekter som observerats hos icke-infödda talare. Vi kör ytterligare en analys av modellens lexikala representationsutrymme, vilket visar att de två utbildningsspråken inte är helt åtskilda i det utrymmet, på samma sätt som språken hos en tvåspråkig mänsklig talare.', 'ro': 'Vorbitorii non-nativi prezintă dificultăți în procesarea cuvintelor vorbite. Multe studii atribuie aceste dificultăți codării fonologice imprecise a cuvintelor din memoria lexicală. Testăm o ipoteză alternativă: că unele dintre aceste dificultăți pot apărea din percepția fonetică a vorbitorilor non-nativi. Antrenăm un model computațional de învățare fonetică, care nu are acces la fonologie, pe una sau două limbi. Mai întâi arătăm că modelul prezintă comportamente previzibile la nivel de telefon și sarcini de discriminare la nivel de cuvânt. Testăm apoi modelul pe o sarcină de procesare a cuvintelor vorbite, arătând că fonologia poate să nu fie necesară pentru a explica unele dintre efectele de procesare a cuvintelor observate la vorbitori non-nativi. Executăm o analiză suplimentară a spațiului de reprezentare lexicală al modelului, arătând că cele două limbi de formare nu sunt complet separate în acel spațiu, similar limbilor unui vorbitor uman bilingv.', 'ur': 'غیر ملی صحبت کرنے والے بات پردازی کے ساتھ مشکلات دکھاتے ہیں. بہت سی مطالعہ ان مشکلات کو لکسیکل یاد میں لکھنے کے لئے فانولوژیکی اکڈینڈ کرنے کے لئے تدبیر دیتے ہیں. ہم ایک مختلف فرضی کی آزمائش کررہے ہیں کہ ان میں سے بعض مشکلات غیر ملی صحبت کرنے والوں کی فرضی نظر سے آسکتے ہیں۔ ہم ایک کمپیوٹریسی موڈل کی تطالب کرتے ہیں جو فانولوژی کے لئے کوئی دسترسی نہیں ہے، ایک یا دو زبانوں پر۔ ہم پہلے دکھاتے ہیں کہ موڈل فون-سطح اور کلمات-سطح جدائی کے کاموں پر پیش بینی کرنے والی رفتار کو دکھاتا ہے. اس کے بعد ہم ایک کلام پردازی کے کام پر مدل کو امتحان کرتے ہیں، اس کو دکھاتے ہیں کہ فانولوژی کوئی بات پردازی اثرات کی تعریف کرنے کے لئے ضرورت نہیں ہو سکتی۔ ہم مدل کے لکسیکل نمایش جگہ کے اضافہ تحلیل کرتے ہیں، دکھاتے ہیں کہ دو تعلیم زبانیں اس جگہ میں پوری طرح جدا نہیں ہوتے، جیسے ایک دوزخ انسان کی زبانوں کے ساتھ۔', 'ta': 'பேசும் வார்த்தை செயல்படுத்தலுடன் சிக்கல்களை காட்டுகிறது. பல ஆராய்ச்சிகள் இந்த கடினமைப்புகளை குறிப்பிட வேண்டும் நாம் ஒரு மாற்று ஹைப்பிரச்சியம் சோதிக்கிறோம்: இந்த சில பிரச்சினைகள் உள்ள பேசுபவர்களின் போன்டெட்டிக் கருத்தில நாங்கள் தொலைபேசி கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் ஒரு கணக்கிட்ட மாதிரி பயிற்சி செய்கிறோம், அது தொலைநுட்பம் அல்லது இரண்டு மொழிகள முதலில் மாதிரி தொலைபேசி மட்டத்திலும் வார்த்தை நிலையிலும் வித்தியாசமான வித்தியாசம் செய்யும் நடத்தை பிறகு நாம் ஒரு சொல்லு செயல்படுத்தும் பணியில் மாதிரியை சோதிக்க வேண்டும், தொலைநுட்பத்தை காண்பிக்கும் சில சொல்லை செயல்பட நாங்கள் மாதிரியின் லெக்சிக் குறிப்பிட்ட இடத்தில் ஒரு கூடுதல் ஆய்வு இயக்குகிறோம், இரண்டு பயிற்சி மொழிகள் முழுமையாக அந்த வெளியில் பி', 'uz': "Name Ko'pchilik o'rganishlarni leksikal xotiradan fonologik kodlash uchun juda qiyin. Biz boshqa hypotezayni sinab ko'rayapmiz: bu muammolar natijadagi gapiruvchilarga fonetik ko'rinishi mumkin. We train a computational model of phonetic learning, which has no access to phonology, on either one or two languages.  Birinchi marta model telefon darajada va so'zlar darajada ta'sir qilish vazifalarini koʻrsatiladi. Keyin biz gapiradigan so'zni boshqarish vazifasidagi modelni sinab ko'raymiz, fonologi qo'llangan gapiruvchilarga ko'p so'zlarni boshqarish kerak emas. Biz modelning leksikal tashkilotning joyini qoʻshimcha analyzer qilamiz, bu ikkita ta'lim tillari shu paytida butunlay ajratilmaydi, huddi ikkita tillar so'zlariga o'xshagan.", 'vi': 'Những người nói không thổ dân thấy khó khăn với việc xử lý từ. Nhiều nghiên cứu gán những khó khăn này cho các từ ngữ bị bác bỏ. Thử nghiệm một giả thuyết khác: một số trong những khó khăn này có thể đến từ nhận thức ngữ âm của người nói không thổ. Chúng tôi đào tạo một mô hình tính ngữ âm học, mà không có quyền sử dụng ngôn ngữ âm thanh, hoặc một hoặc hai ngôn ngữ. Trước tiên, chúng tôi cho thấy kiểu mẫu có hành vi dễ đoán trên các nhiệm vụ phân biệt qua điện thoại và từ. Sau đó chúng ta thử nghiệm mô hình trong một nhiệm vụ xử lý từ đã nói, cho thấy rằng từ âm thanh có thể không cần thiết để giải thích một số hiệu ứng xử lý từ được phát hiện ở người không gốc. Chúng tôi đã phân tích thêm các ngôn ngữ văn học của mô hình, cho thấy hai ngôn ngữ giáo dục không được tách biệt hoàn to àn trong khoảng trống đó, giống như ngôn ngữ của một người phát ngôn.', 'bg': 'Неродните говорещи показват трудности при обработката на говорен текст. Много изследвания приписват тези трудности на неточното фонологично кодиране на думи в лексикалната памет. Тестваме алтернативна хипотеза: някои от тези трудности могат да възникнат от фонетичното възприятие на чуждоезиковите. Обучаваме изчислителен модел на фонетично обучение, който няма достъп до фонологията, на един или два езика. Първо показваме, че моделът показва предвидимо поведение при задачи за дискриминация на ниво телефон и ниво дума. След това тестваме модела върху задача за обработка на говорен текст, показвайки, че фонологията може да не е необходима за обясняване на някои от ефектите на текстообработването, наблюдавани при чуждоезикови. Извършваме допълнителен анализ на лексикалното пространство на модела, показвайки, че двата езика за обучение не са напълно разделени в това пространство, подобно на езиците на двуезичен човек говорител.', 'da': 'Ikke-indfødte talere viser vanskeligheder med talt ordbehandling. Mange undersøgelser tillægger disse vanskeligheder til upræcis fonologisk kodning af ord i leksikalsk hukommelse. Vi tester en alternativ hypotese: at nogle af disse vanskeligheder kan opstå fra de ikke-indfødte taleres fonetiske opfattelse. Vi træner en beregningsmodel for fonetisk læring, som ikke har adgang til fonologi, på hverken et eller to sprog. Vi viser først, at modellen udviser forudsigelig adfærd på telefonniveau og ordniveau diskrimination opgaver. Vi tester derefter modellen på en talt tekstbehandlingsopgave, der viser, at fonologi måske ikke er nødvendig for at forklare nogle af de tekstbehandlingseffekter, der observeres hos ikke-indfødte talere. Vi kører en yderligere analyse af modellens leksikalske repræsentationsrum, der viser, at de to træningssprog ikke er helt adskilt i dette rum, på samme måde som sprogene hos en tosproget menneskelig taler.', 'de': 'Nicht-Muttersprachler zeigen Schwierigkeiten bei der Sprachverarbeitung. Viele Studien führen diese Schwierigkeiten auf eine ungenaue phonologische Kodierung von Wörtern im lexikalischen Gedächtnis zurück. Wir testen eine alternative Hypothese: Einige dieser Schwierigkeiten können durch die phonetische Wahrnehmung der Nicht-Muttersprachler entstehen. Wir trainieren ein computergestütztes Modell des phonetischen Lernens, das keinen Zugang zur Phonologie hat, auf einer oder zwei Sprachen. Zunächst zeigen wir, dass das Modell vorhersagbare Verhaltensweisen bei Diskriminierungsaufgaben auf Telefonebene und Wortebene aufweist. Anschließend testen wir das Modell an einer gesprochenen Textverarbeitungsaufgabe und zeigen, dass Phonologie möglicherweise nicht notwendig ist, um einige der Textverarbeitungseffekte zu erklären, die bei Nicht-Muttersprachlern beobachtet werden. Wir führen eine zusätzliche Analyse des lexikalischen Repräsentationsraums des Modells durch, die zeigt, dass die beiden Trainingssprachen in diesem Raum nicht vollständig getrennt sind, ähnlich wie die Sprachen eines zweisprachigen menschlichen Sprechers.', 'id': 'Pembicara bukan asli menunjukkan kesulitan dengan proses kata berbicara. Banyak penelitian atribut kesulitan ini untuk tidak mengkecis pengekodan fonologi kata-kata dalam memori lexik. Kami menguji hipotesis alternatif: bahwa beberapa kesulitan ini dapat muncul dari persepsi fonetik pembicara bukan asli. Kami melatih model komputasi belajar fonetik, yang tidak memiliki akses ke fonologi, dalam salah satu atau dua bahasa. Kami pertama-tama menunjukkan bahwa model menunjukkan perilaku yang dapat diprediksi pada tingkat telepon dan tugas diskriminasi tingkat kata. Kemudian kita menguji model pada tugas pemroses kata berbicara, menunjukkan bahwa fonologi mungkin tidak perlu untuk menjelaskan beberapa efek pemroses kata yang dilihat dalam pembicara bukan asli. Kami menjalankan analisis tambahan dari ruang representation lexik model, menunjukkan bahwa dua bahasa latihan tidak sepenuhnya terpisah di ruang itu, sama dengan bahasa seorang pembicara manusia dua bahasa.', 'hr': 'Nedomaći govornici pokazuju teškoće s obrazovanjem riječi. Mnogi ispitivanja pripisuju te poteškoće za nepričavanje fonološkog kodiranja riječi u leksičkom sjećanju. Testiramo alternativnu hipotezu: da neki od ovih poteškoća mogu izaći iz fonetičkog percepcije neproditelja govornika. Vježbamo računalni model fonetičkog učenja, koji nema pristup fonologiji, na jednom ili dva jezika. Prvo pokazujemo da model pokazuje predvidljivo ponašanje na razini telefona i diskriminacijskim zadatkima na razini riječi. Onda testiramo model na određenom zadatku obrađivanja riječi, pokazujući da fonologija možda nije potrebna da objasnimo neke od učinka obrađivanja riječi koje su primijećene na neprodičnim govornicima. Pokrenuli smo dodatnu analizu leksičkog prostora predstavljanja model a, pokazujući da se dva jezika obuke ne potpuno razdvajaju u tom prostoru, slično jezicima dvojezičkog ljudskog govornika.', 'nl': 'Niet-moedertaalsprekers vertonen problemen met gesproken tekstverwerking. Veel studies schrijven deze moeilijkheden toe aan onnauwkeurige fonologische codering van woorden in het lexicale geheugen. We testen een alternatieve hypothese: dat sommige van deze problemen kunnen voortvloeien uit de fonetische perceptie van niet-moedertaalsprekers. We trainen een computermodel van fonetisch leren, dat geen toegang heeft tot fonologie, op één of twee talen. We laten eerst zien dat het model voorspelbaar gedrag vertoont op telefoon- en woordniveau discriminatietaken. Vervolgens testen we het model op een gesproken tekstverwerkingstaak, waaruit blijkt dat fonologie mogelijk niet nodig is om sommige tekstverwerkingseffecten te verklaren die worden waargenomen bij niet-moedertaalsprekers. We voeren een aanvullende analyse uit van de lexicale representatieruimte van het model, waaruit blijkt dat de twee trainingstalen niet volledig gescheiden zijn in die ruimte, vergelijkbaar met de talen van een tweetalige menselijke spreker.', 'fa': 'سخنرانی غیر طبیعی مشکلات با پرداخت کلمات صحبت می\u200cکنند. بسیاری از مطالعه\u200cها این مشکلات را برای تحقیق کردن رمزگذاری کلمات در حافظه\u200cی زبان\u200cشناسی تحریک می\u200cکنند. ما فرضیه دیگری را امتحان می\u200cکنیم: بعضی از این مشکلات می\u200cتوانند از فرضیه\u200cهای صحبت\u200cکننده\u200cهای غیر طبیعی به وجود بیاورند. ما یک مدل کامپیوتری از یادگیری تلفنی آموزش می کنیم که هیچ دسترسی به تلفن\u200cشناسی در یک یا دو زبان ندارد. اولین بار نشان می دهیم که مدل رفتار قابل پیش بینی در سطح تلفن و وظیفه جدایی کلمات را نشان می دهد. سپس ما مدل را روی یک کار پردازش کلمات صحبت می\u200cکنیم، نشان می\u200cدهیم که ممکن است تلفن\u200cشناسی لازم نیست تا بعضی از اثرات پردازش کلمات را توضیح دهیم که در زبان\u200cهای غیر از طبیعی مشاهده شده است. ما یک تحلیل اضافی از فضای نمایش زبانی مدل را انجام می دهیم، نشان می دهیم که دو زبان آموزش کاملا در آن فضا جدا نشده است، مانند زبان یک صحبت کننده انسان دو زبان.', 'sw': 'Wazungumzaji wasio na asili wanaonyesha vigumu kwa upasuaji wa maneno yanayozungumzwa. Tafiti nyingi zinaonyesha changamoto hizi za kuboresha ukomo wa kiufundi wa maneno katika kumbukumbu ya lexico. Tunazijaribu dhana mbadala: kwamba baadhi ya matatizo haya yanaweza kutokana na mtazamo wa mtandao wa intaneti wa wazungumzaji wasio wenyewe. Tunafundisha mfumo wa kujifunza kwa hisabati, ambao hauna upatikanaji wa lugha moja au mbili. Kwanza tunaonyesha kwamba modeli inaonyesha tabia zinazotabiriwa katika kiwango cha simu na kazi za ubaguzi wa rangi. Kisha tunajaribu mtindo wa kazi ya maneno yanayozungumzwa, kuonyesha kwamba simu za mkononi inaweza kuwa haina haja ya kuelezea baadhi ya madhara ya maneno yanayoonekana katika mazungumzo yasiyo ya asili. Tunaendesha uchambuzi wa ziada wa nafasi ya uwakilishaji wa muundo huo, tukionyesha kuwa lugha hizo mbili za mafunzo hazijapangwa kabisa katika nafasi hiyo, kwa mfano na lugha za mzungumzaji wa lugha mbili.', 'ko': '비모국어 인사는 구어 문자 처리에 어려움이 있다.많은 연구에서 이러한 어려움을 어휘 기억 속의 단어의 부정확한 음성 인코딩으로 돌렸다.우리는 또 다른 가설을 검증했다. 그 중 일부 어려움은 비모국어인의 음성 감지에서 비롯될 수 있다.우리는 음성 학습의 계산 모델을 훈련시켰는데, 그것은 한 가지 또는 두 가지 언어에서 음운학을 사용할 수 없다.우리는 우선 이 모델이 전화 수준과 단어 수준의 판별 임무에서 예측 가능한 행동을 보이고 있음을 증명했다.그 다음에 우리는 구어 문자 처리 임무에서 이 모델을 테스트한 결과 비모국어인에게서 관찰된 일부 문자 처리 효과는 음운학으로 해석할 필요가 없을 것 같다.우리는 모델의 어휘 표시 공간에 대해 별도의 분석을 실시한 결과 두 가지 훈련 언어가 이 공간에서 완전히 분리되지 않았고 이중 언어인 인간의 언어와 유사하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'af': "Onnatuurlike sprekkers vertoon moeilikhede met praat woordeverwerking. Baie studie eienskap hierdie moeilikhede om die fonologiese kodering van woorde in die leksiese geheue te verwerp. Ons probeer 'n alternatiewe hipotees: dat sommige van hierdie moeilikhede kan opkom van die fonetiese aandag van die non-native sprekkers. Ons trein 'n rekenaarsie model van fonetiese leer wat geen toegang tot fonologie het nie, op een of twee tale nie. Ons wys eerste dat die model voorskoubaar gedrag op foon-vlak en woord-vlak diskriminasie taak vertoon. Ons toets dan die model op 'n praat woordeverwerking taak, wys dat fonologie dalk nie nodig is om sommige van die woordeverwerking effekte te verduidelik wat in nie-natuurlike sprekkers aangesien is nie. Ons hardloop 'n addisionele analiseer van die model se leksiese verteenwoordingsruimte, wat wys dat die twee onderwerking tale nie heeltemal in daardie ruimte geskei is nie, gelyk a an die tale van 'n twee tale menslike spreker.", 'am': 'የአገራቸው ንግግር ያሉ ቃላት በንግግር ማቀናቀል ችግር ያሳያል፡፡ ብዙ ትምህርት የፌሎጂካዊ ቃላትን በሊክሲካዊ ማስታወስ ለማሳደግ አስቸጋሪ ነው፡፡ ሌሎችን ምናልባዊ hypothesis እንፈትናለን፤ ከእነዚህ ጭንቀት አንዳንዶቹ ከአገራቸው አነጋሪዎች ከፎንnetic አየር እንዲወጣ ይችላል፡፡ የፎንጦሎጂ መግኘት የሌለ አንድ ወይም ሁለት ቋንቋ የሌለው የፎንቲክ ትምህርት ምሳሌ እናስተምራለን፡፡ መጀመሪያ እናሳየዋለን፤ ሞዴላው በtelefon-ደረጃ እና በቃላት-ደረጃ ልዩንነት ስራዎችን የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡ ከዚያም በኋላ ምሳሌውን በተናገሩት ቃል ማቀናጃ ሥራ ላይ እንሞክራለን፣ ፎሎጂ በአገር ንግግር ተቃዋሚዎች ላይ የተደረገውን አንዳንዶችን የቃላት ክፍሎች ለማብራራት አይችልም፡፡ በሁለቱ ተማሪዎቹ ቋንቋዎች ሙሉ ሳይለይ፣ ለሁለት ቋንቋዎች የሚናገር ቋንቋ ቋንቋ እንደተለያዩ እናሳየናለን፡፡', 'tr': 'Adaty çykyşylar gürleýän sözler bilen kynçylyklary görkez. Köp okuwçy bu kynçylyklary leksiýa yada sözleriniň fonolojik kodlemesini çykarmak üçin süýtgedýär. Biz başga bir hypotezi barýarys: bu kynçylyklaryň käbirlerini yerli çykyşlaryň fonetik pikirlerinden döredip biler. Biz fonologiýada, bir ýa-da iki dilde hiç hili ulaşmaýan fonetik öwrenmeniň kalkuly nusgasyny öwredýäris. Biz ilkinji gezek nusganyň telefon derejesinde we söz derejesinde diskriminasiň taýýarlanabilir zadyny tanaýandyrýandygyny görkezýäris. Sonra gürleýän söz işleme täblisinde nusgasyny barýarys, fonologiýa yerli sözlerinde sereden söz işleme täsirlerini düşündirmek üçin gerek däldir. Biz nusgalaryň leksiýa boşlukynyň esasy analyzasyny çykarýarys. Bu iki okuw diliniň bu ýerde hiç hili bölmedigini görkezýäris. Şonuň ýaly iki dilli adam dilinde s özleşýän dilleriň ýaly.', 'sq': 'Fjalëdhënësit jo-vendas tregojnë vështirësi me procesimin e fjalëve të folura. Shumë studime i përshkruajnë këto vështirësi për të imprecisuar kodimin fonologjik të fjalëve në kujtesën lexike. Ne testojmë një hipotezë alternative: se disa nga këto vështirësi mund të vijnë nga perceptimi fonetik i folësve jo-vendas. Ne trajnojmë një model kompjuterik të mësimit fonetik, i cili nuk ka akses në fonologji, në një apo dy gjuhë. Ne së pari tregojmë se modeli ekspozon sjellje të parashikueshme në nivelin e telefonit dhe detyrat e diskriminimit në nivelin e fjalëve. Ne pastaj testojmë model in në një detyrë të përdorimit të fjalëve të folura, duke treguar se fonologjia mund të mos jetë e nevojshme për të shpjeguar disa nga efektet e përdorimit të fjalëve të vëzhguar në folësit jo-vendas. Ne bëjmë një analizë shtesë të hapësirës s ë përfaqësimit lexik të modelit, duke treguar se dy gjuhët e stërvitjes nuk janë të ndara plotësisht në atë hapësirë, në mënyrë të ngjashme me gjuhët e një folësi njerëzore dygjuhëse.', 'az': 'Yerli danışanlar danışmaq üçün çətinlikləri göstərər. Birçox təhsil, bu çətinlikləri leksik yadına yazılan sözlərin fonolojik kodlamasını təmizləmək üçün təhsil edir. Biz alternatif bir hipotezi imtahana çəkirik: bu çətinliklərdən bəzisi yerli danışanların fonetik görünüşündən başlayabilir. Biz fonetik öyrənməsinin hesablama modelini təhsil edirik ki, fonologiya istifadə edilməz, bir ya da iki dildə. Biz ilk dəfə modelin telefon seviyyətində və söz seviyyətində müəyyən edilən davranışları göstərir. Sonra söylədiyimiz söz işləməsi işində modeli sınayırıq, fonoloji yerli danışanlarda görünən söz işləmə efektlərinin bəzisini a çıqlamaq üçün ehtiyacı yoxdur. Biz model in in leksik göstəricisi alanının əlavə analizi çəkirik, iki təhsil dilinin bu alanda tamamilə ayrılmadığını göstərək, iki dil danışıcının dillərinə bənzəyir.', 'bn': 'Non-native speakers show difficulties with spoken word processing.  অনেক গবেষণা লেক্সিক্সিয়াল স্মৃতিতে শব্দের ফোলিজিক্যাল এনকোডিং ব্যাখ্যা করার ব্যাপারে এই সমস্যার বি আমরা একটি বিকল্প হাইপাইটসিস পরীক্ষা করছি: এই সমস্ত কষ্টের মধ্যে থেকে স্থানীয় ভাষাকারীদের ফোনেটিক ধারণা থেকে বের হতে পার আমরা ফোনেটিক শিক্ষার গণনা মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ দিচ্ছি, যা ফোলোজিকে প্রবেশ করার কোনো প্রবেশ নেই, যা কোনো একটি অথবা দুই ভাষা আমরা প্রথমে দেখাচ্ছি যে মডেল ফোন-স্তর এবং শব্দ-স্তরের বৈষম্যের কাজে ভবিষ্যৎবাণী আচরণ প্রদর্শন করে। তারপর আমরা একটি কথা বলা শব্দ প্রক্রিয়ার কাজে মডেল পরীক্ষা করি, যেখানে দেখা যাচ্ছে যে ফোনোলজির কিছু শব্দ প্রক্রিয়ার প্রভাব ব্যাখ্য আমরা মডেলের লেক্সিক্যাল প্রতিনিধিত্বের স্থানের আরো বিশ্লেষণ চালাই, যেখানে দেখাচ্ছি যে দুটি প্রশিক্ষণ ভাষাগুলো সেই স্পেসে পুরোপু', 'hy': "Ոչ-բնիկ խոսնակները բարդ են ցույց տալիս խոսվող բառերի վերաբերյալ: Շատ ուսումնասիրություններ են պատկերացնում այս դժվարությունները լեքսիկական հիշողության բառերի ոչ ճշգրիտ ֆոնոլոգիական կոդավորման համար: We test an alternative hypothesis: that some of these difficulties can arise from the non-native speakers' phonetic perception.  Մենք վարժեցնում ենք ֆոնէտիկ ուսումնասիրության հաշվարկների մոդել, որը ֆոնոլոգիայի հնարավորություն չունի կամ մեկ, կամ երկու լեզուներով: Առաջին հերթին ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մոդելը ցույց է տալիս կանխատեսելի վարքագծեր հեռախոսային և բառային մակարդակի խտրականության խնդիրներում: Այնուհետև մենք փորձում ենք մոդելը խոսված բառերի վերամշակման խնդրի վրա, ցույց տալով, որ ֆոնոլոգիան հնարավոր չէ բացատրել բառերի վերամշակման էֆեկտներից որոշները, որոնք դիտարկվել են ոչ բնիկ խոսնակների մոտ Մենք կատարում ենք մոդելի լեքսիկական ներկայացման տարածության ավելացրական վերլուծություն, որը ցույց է տալիս, որ երկու ուսուցման լեզուները լիովին չեն բաժանվել այդ տարածքում, ինչպես երկլեզու մարդկային խոսնակի լեզուները:", 'cs': 'Nerodilí mluvčí vykazují potíže se zpracováním mluveného slova. Mnoho studií připisuje tyto obtíže nepřesnému fonologickému kódování slov v lexikální paměti. Testujeme alternativní hypotézu, že některé z těchto obtíží mohou vzniknout z fonetického vnímání nerodilých mluvčích. Trénujeme výpočetní model fonetického učení, který nemá přístup k fonologii, na jednom nebo dvou jazycích. Nejprve ukazujeme, že model vykazuje předvídatelné chování na úrovni telefonu a slova diskriminace úloh. Model pak testujeme na úkolu zpracování mluveného slova, což ukazuje, že fonologie nemusí být nutná k vysvětlení některých efektů zpracování slova pozorovaných u rodilých mluvčích. Provedeme další analýzu lexikálního reprezentačního prostoru modelu, která ukazuje, že dva tréninkové jazyky nejsou v tomto prostoru zcela odděleny, podobně jako jazyky dvojjazyčného lidského mluvčího.', 'bs': 'Nedomaći govornici pokazuju teškoće s obrazovanjem riječi. Mnogi ispitivanja prikazuju ove poteškoće da bi neprihvatili fonološki kodiranje riječi u leksičkom sjećanju. Testiramo alternativnu hipotezu: da neki od ovih poteškoća mogu izaći iz fonetičkog pogleda neproditelja govornika. Vježbamo računalni model fonetičkog učenja, koji nema pristup fonologiji, na jednom ili dva jezika. Prvo pokazujemo da model pokazuje predvidljivo ponašanje na telefonskom nivou i diskriminacijskom zadatku na nivou riječi. Onda testiramo model na određenom zadatku obrade riječi, pokazujući da fonologija možda nije potrebna da objasnimo neke od efekta obrade riječi koje su primijećene na neprodičnim govornicima. Provodimo dodatnu analizu svemira leksičkog predstavljanja model a, pokazujući da se dva jezika obuke ne potpuno razdvajaju u tom prostoru, kao i jezika dvojezičkog ljudskog govornika.', 'et': 'Mitte-emakeelsed kõnelejad näitavad raskusi suulise teksti töötlemisega. Paljud uuringud omistavad neid raskusi sõnade ebatäpsele fonoloogilisele kodeerimisele leksikaalmälus. Testime alternatiivset hüpoteesi: mõned neist raskustest võivad tekkida mitte-emakeelsete kõnelejate foneetilisest tajumisest. Koolitame foneetilise õppe arvutusmudelit, millel puudub juurdepääs fonoloogiale, kas ühes või kahes keeles. Esiteks näitame, et mudel näitab prognoositavat käitumist telefoni ja sõna tasandi diskrimineerimise ülesannetes. Seejärel testime mudelit kõneleva teksti töötlemise ülesandel, näidates, et fonoloogia ei pruugi olla vajalik mõningate mitte-emakeelsetel kõnelejatel täheldatud tekstitöötlemise efektide selgitamiseks. Analüüsime mudeli leksikaalset esindusruumi täiendavalt, näidates, et kaks koolituskeelt ei ole selles ruumis täielikult eraldatud, sarnaselt kahekeelse inimkõneleja keeltega.', 'ca': "Non-native speakers show difficulties with spoken word processing.  Molts estudis attribuen aquestes dificultats a la codificació fonològica imprecisa de paraules a la memòria lèxica. Testem una hipòtesi alternativa: que algunes d'aquestes dificultats poden sorgir de la percepció fonètica dels parlants no natius. Ensenyem un model computacional d'aprenentatge fonètic, que no té accés a la fonologia, ni en una o dues llengües. Primer demostram que el model mostra comportaments previsibles en tasques de discriminació a nivell de telèfon i de paraules. Ens provem el model en una tasca de processament de paraules parlades, mostrant que la fonologia potser no és necessària per explicar alguns dels efectes de processament de paraules observats en parlants no natius. Fem una an àlisi adicional de l'espai de representació lèxica del model, mostrant que les dues llengües d'entrenament no estan totalment separades en aquest espai, a la mateixa manera que les llengües d'un parlant humà bilingüe.", 'fi': 'Muilla kuin ﾃ､idinkielenﾃ､ﾃ､n puhuvilla on vaikeuksia suullisen tekstin kﾃ､sittelyssﾃ､. Monissa tutkimuksissa nﾃ､mﾃ､ vaikeudet johtuvat sanaston epﾃ､tarkkasta fonologisesta koodauksesta. Testaamme vaihtoehtoista hypoteesia: ettﾃ､ osa nﾃ､istﾃ､ vaikeuksista voi johtua ei-syntyperﾃ､isten puhujien foneettisesta havainnosta. Koulutamme foneettisen oppimisen laskennallista mallia, jolla ei ole pﾃ､ﾃ､syﾃ､ fonologiaan, yhdellﾃ､ tai kahdella kielellﾃ､. Ensin osoitamme, ettﾃ､ malli nﾃ､yttﾃ､ﾃ､ ennakoitavissa olevan kﾃ､yttﾃ､ytymisen puhelintason ja sanatason syrjintﾃ､tehtﾃ､vissﾃ､. Tﾃ､mﾃ､n jﾃ､lkeen testaamme mallia puhuttujen tekstinkﾃ､sittelytehtﾃ､vien avulla, mikﾃ､ osoittaa, ettﾃ､ fonologia ei vﾃ､lttﾃ､mﾃ､ttﾃ､ ole tarpeen selittﾃ､mﾃ､ﾃ､n joitakin ei-ﾃ､idinkielen puhujilla havaittuja tekstinkﾃ､sittelytehosteita. Analysoimme mallin leksikaalista esitystilaa ja osoitamme, ettﾃ､ kaksi koulutuskieltﾃ､ ei ole tﾃ､ysin erotettu toisistaan siinﾃ､ tilassa, kuten kaksikielisen ihmisen puhujan kielet.', 'he': 'מדברים לא מקומיים מראים קשות עם עיבוד מילים מדובר. מחקרים רבים מכוונים את הקשיחות האלה לקוד פונולוגי לא מדויק של מילים בזיכרון הלקסי. אנו בודקים היפותזה אלטרנטיבית: שחלק מהקשים האלה יכולים להתרחש מהתפיסה הפונטית של הרופאים הלא-מקומיים. אנחנו מאמן מודל מחשבי של לימוד פונטי, שאין לו גישה לפונולוגיה, בשפה אחת או שתיים. We first show that the model exhibits predictable behaviors on phone-level and word-level discrimination tasks.  ואז נבחן את המודל על משימה מעבדת מילים מדברת, שמראה שפונולוגיה אולי לא הכרחית להסביר חלק מהתופעות מעבדת מילים שמוצאות ברברים לא מקומיים. אנחנו מנהלים ניתוח נוסף של מרחב ההצגה הלקסית של המודל, שמראה ששת שפות האימונים לא נפרדות לחלוטין במרחב הזה, באופן דומה לשפות של דובר אנושי שתיים שפות.', 'ha': "Babu-da-saurãren magana yana nuna masu tsananin aiki da aka yi magana. Akwai karatun masu yawa na ƙayyade masu cikin musamman da za'a buƙata kodi na folojiki a cikin kumbar lokaci. Munã jarraba wani zato mai dabar-dabam: cewa wasu daga waɗannan masu zartar da za ta fita daga bakin da ke samu'a-mataifa. Tuna kõre wani misali na ƙidãyar da za'a iya karanta littafin na'ura, wanda ba ya iya iya amfani da folojiki, ko kan lugha guda ko biyu. Muna nũna farkon da misalin ya nuna aikin wanda ake yi wa jinkiri a kan aikin da za'a yi sauri-zane da masu yin sauri-daraja. Sa'an nan kuma Munã jarraba misalin a kan wani aikin aiki da aka yi magana, mai nũna cewa ba za'a ƙayyade folojiya ba dõmin ya bayyana wani abu na fassarar aiki da aka gani cikin masu baka-mataifa ba. Tuna tafiyar wani anayyar ƙari wa filin mai nuna mulki, ko kuma Muke nuna, ba za'a rarraba harshen biyu ba da cikakki cikin wannan fili, kamar da harshen wani mai magana na mutum biyu.", 'sk': 'Neravni govorci kažejo težave z obdelavo govorjenega besedila. Številne študije te težave pripisujejo netočnemu fonološkemu kodiranju besed v leksikalnem spominu. Testiramo alternativno hipotezo: da lahko nekatere od teh težav izhajajo iz fonetične percepcije tujih govorcev. Usposabljamo računalniški model fonetičnega učenja, ki nima dostopa do fonologije, v enem ali dveh jezikih. Najprej pokažemo, da model kaže predvidljivo vedenje pri opravilih diskriminacije na ravni telefona in na ravni besed. Model nato testiramo na nalogi govorjene besedilne obdelave in pokažemo, da fonologija morda ni potrebna za pojasnitev nekaterih učinkov besedilne obdelave, opaženih pri tujih govorcih. Izvedli smo dodatno analizo leksikalnega reprezentacijskega prostora modela in pokazali, da oba jezika usposabljanja v tem prostoru nista popolnoma ločena, podobno kot jezika dvojezičnega človeškega govorca.', 'bo': 'སྐད་དོན་མི་སྤྱི་ཁོང་གི་མི་རྣམས་ལས་ཀློག་སྟངས་ལ་དཀའ་ངལ་གཏོང་བ ལྟ་ཞིབ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ནི་དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་དག་སྐྱེལ་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་ནང་གི་སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་རྗེས་སུ་གྲངས་མཚམས་ཁག་ཅིག་བརྟག་དཔྱད་ཡོད། དཀའ་ངལ་ཅིག་ཀྱང་དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་དག་ལས་མཐུན་ཐུབ་པ་མེད་པའི་ས ང་ཚོས་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་སློབ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་མིག་དཔྱད་ཅིག་དེ་ལྟ་བུ་ཡིན་པ་མིན་ན་གཅིག་ཡང་ན་སྐད་ ང་ཚོས་དང་པོ་ནས་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་སྔོན་ཅན་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་དང་གཟུགས་རིས་ཁྱད་པར་བྱེད་པའི་བྱ་འགུལ་དང་། འོན་ཀྱང་ང་ཚོས་བློ་བརྗོད་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་ལས་རིམ་པ་ཞིག་གི་མིང་དཔྱད་ཞིག་ཏུ་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱས་ན། སྐད་ཡིག་གཏན་འབེབས་ན་མི ང་ཚོས་མིག', 'jv': 'Gak Coco-Colo Pas Awak dhéwé éntuk kuwi nggawe kaluluh kanggo ngerasai akeh gambaran kelas nang ingkang kelas. Awak dhéwé éntukno ngerti apakno: kuwi tindong sing apik dhéwé kuwi nggawe barang kelas nang ngerasakno parakno. Awak dhéwé luwih akeh sistem komputer ing nggambar kelangan teletiki, sing or a ana akses banjur teletiki, sampek saben uga duruh. Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan nik model kuwi wis ngerasakno sawar nggawe barang telepong lan kelas-layang Awak dhéwé ujian model ning kelompok sing bisa perusahaan kelompok, iso nggambar kelompok punika dipun dianggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe Perintasun efek sing bisalakno ning ora ono lockke Awak dhéwé mlayu menyang dipunanggé kanggo langgar nggambar luwih model, iso nggambar obah langa kuwi tindang durung nggawe barang iki luwih apik, lan uga wih-wih langa sing luwih apik.'}
{'en': 'Bootstrapping Relation Extractors using Syntactic Search by Examples', 'ar': 'Bootstrapping Relation Extractors باستخدام البحث النحوي بالأمثلة', 'es': 'Arrancar extractores de relaciones mediante búsqueda sintáctica por ejemplos', 'fr': "Extracteurs de relations d'amorçage à l'aide de la recherche syntaxique par exemples", 'pt': 'Extratores de relações de inicialização usando pesquisa sintática por exemplos', 'ja': '例による構文検索を使用した関係抽出のブートストラップ', 'zh': '用语法搜引提取器(如示例)', 'hi': 'उदाहरणों द्वारा वाक्यात्मक खोज का उपयोग करते हुए बूटस्ट्रैपिंग संबंध चिमटा', 'ru': 'Загрузка экстракторов связей с использованием синтаксического поиска по примерам', 'ga': 'Extractors Gaol Bootstrapping ag baint úsáide as Cuardach Comhréire de réir Samplaí', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Estratori di relazioni di avvio utilizzando la ricerca sintattica per esempi', 'hu': 'A kapcsolatkivonók indítása példák szerinti szintaktikus kereséssel', 'el': 'Εκχύλισμα σχέσεων με τη χρήση Συντακτικής Αναζήτηση με παραδείγματα', 'lt': 'Comment', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് സിന്\u200dടാക്ടിക് തെരച്ചില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എക്സ്ട്രാക്', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Estratturi tar-Relazzjoni ta’ Trażżin ta’ Bootstrapping bl-użu ta’ Tfittxija Sintattika skont Eżempji', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Ekstraktory relacji bootstrapping za pomocą syntaktycznego wyszukiwania według przykładów', 'ro': 'Extractoare de relații de pornire utilizând căutarea sintattică după exemple', 'kk': 'Мисалдар бойынша синтактикалық іздеу көмегімен қатынастарды тарқатуName', 'sr': 'Изхватање връзких екстрактора користећи синтактичну тражбу примерима', 'mn': 'Синтактикийн хайлт жишээлүүд ашиглаж буулгах харилцааны хайлтыг татаж авагчид', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'உதாரணங்களால் ஒத்திசைவு தேடுதல் பயன்படுத்தி தொடர்பு வெளியீடுகளை புத்தகக்குறிப்புகள்', 'so': 'Tusaale ahaan', 'sv': 'Starta relationsextraktorer med hjälp av syntaktisk sökning efter exempel', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Khởi động tương tác các máy móc sử dụng Tìm pháp thuật', 'bg': 'Екстрактори на връзките за зареждане, използващи синтактично търсене по примери', 'nl': 'Opstappen van Relatie Extractors met behulp van syntactisch zoeken op voorbeelden', 'de': 'Bootstrapping Relation Extractors mit syntaktischer Suche nach Beispielen', 'id': 'Ekstraktor Hubungan Bootstrapping menggunakan Pencarian Sintaktik Oleh Contoh', 'da': 'Bootstrapping Relation Extractors ved hjælp af Syntactic Search by Exemples', 'hr': 'Pokretanje odnosa ekstraktora koristeći sintaktičku pretragu primjerima', 'ko': '예를 들어 문법 검색 안내 관계 추출기 사용하기', 'sw': 'Picha za Kuhusiana', 'tr': 'Misal görä Sintaktik Ahtaryş ullanýarlar', 'fa': 'Name', 'sq': 'Shtypja e marrëdhënieve për ekstraktorët duke përdorur kërkimin sintaktik nga shembuj', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'সিন্ট্যাক্টিক অনুসন্ধান ব্যবহার করে বুটট্র্যাপিং সংযোগ এক্সট্র্যাক্টর', 'bs': 'Primjerama prikupljanja odnosa koristeći sintaktičku pretragu', 'cs': 'Extraktory vztahů bootstrapping pomocí syntaktického vyhledávání podle příkladů', 'az': 'Sintaktik QńĪdńĪrma m…ôs…ôll…ôri il…ô Sintaktik ńįliŇükil…ôri √áatńĪcńĪlar', 'et': 'Bootstrapping Relation Extractor kasutades süntaktilist otsingut näidete järgi', 'fi': 'Bootstrapping Relation Extractors using Syntactic Search by Exemples', 'ca': 'Extractors de relació de trampes emprant la recerca sintàctica per exemple', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'משתמשים בחיפוש סינטקטי על ידי דוגמאות', 'sk': 'Bootstrapping Relation Extractors z uporabo Syntactic Iskanje po primerih', 'bo': 'Bootstrapping Relation Extractors using Syntactic Search by Examples'}
{'en': 'The advent of neural-networks in NLP brought with it substantial improvements in supervised relation extraction. However, obtaining a sufficient quantity of training data remains a key challenge. In this work we propose a process for bootstrapping training datasets which can be performed quickly by non-NLP-experts. We take advantage of search engines over syntactic-graphs (Such as Shlain et al. (2020)) which expose a friendly by-example syntax. We use these to obtain positive examples by searching for sentences that are syntactically similar to user input examples. We apply this technique to relations from TACRED and DocRED and show that the resulting models are competitive with models trained on manually annotated data and on data obtained from distant supervision. The models also outperform models trained using NLG data augmentation techniques. Extending the search-based approach with the NLG method further improves the results.', 'ar': 'جلب ظهور الشبكات العصبية في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية معها تحسينات كبيرة في استخراج العلاقة تحت الإشراف. ومع ذلك ، لا يزال الحصول على كمية كافية من بيانات التدريب يمثل تحديًا رئيسيًا. في هذا العمل ، نقترح عملية لمجموعات بيانات التدريب التمهيدية والتي يمكن إجراؤها بسرعة بواسطة خبراء غير متخصصين في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. نحن نستفيد من محركات البحث على الرسوم البيانية النحوية (مثل Shlain et al. (2020)) التي تعرض بناء جملة سهل الاستخدام. نستخدمها للحصول على أمثلة إيجابية من خلال البحث عن جمل مشابهة نحويًا لأمثلة إدخال المستخدم. نحن نطبق هذه التقنية على العلاقات من TACRED و DocRED ونبين أن النماذج الناتجة قادرة على المنافسة مع النماذج المدربة على البيانات المشروحة يدويًا وعلى البيانات التي تم الحصول عليها من الإشراف البعيد. تتفوق النماذج أيضًا على النماذج المدربة باستخدام تقنيات زيادة بيانات NLG. يؤدي توسيع النهج القائم على البحث باستخدام طريقة NLG إلى تحسين النتائج بشكل أكبر.', 'pt': 'O advento das redes neurais na PNL trouxe melhorias substanciais na extração de relações supervisionadas. No entanto, obter uma quantidade suficiente de dados de treinamento continua sendo um desafio fundamental. Neste trabalho propomos um processo de bootstrapping de conjuntos de dados de treinamento que pode ser realizado rapidamente por não especialistas em PNL. Aproveitamos os mecanismos de pesquisa sobre os grafos sintáticos (como Shlain et al. (2020)) que expõem uma sintaxe amigável por exemplo. Nós os usamos para obter exemplos positivos procurando por frases que sejam sintaticamente semelhantes aos exemplos de entrada do usuário. Aplicamos esta técnica às relações do TACRED e DocRED e mostramos que os modelos resultantes são competitivos com modelos treinados em dados anotados manualmente e em dados obtidos de supervisão à distância. Os modelos também superam os modelos treinados usando técnicas de aumento de dados NLG. Estender a abordagem baseada em pesquisa com o método NLG melhora ainda mais os resultados.', 'fr': "L'avènement des réseaux neuronaux dans la PNL a apporté des améliorations substantielles dans l'extraction de relations supervisées. Cependant, l'obtention d'une quantité suffisante de données de formation reste un défi majeur. Dans ce travail, nous proposons un processus d'amorçage des ensembles de données d'entraînement qui peut être exécuté rapidement par des non-experts en NLP. Nous profitons des moteurs de recherche plutôt que des graphes syntaxiques (tels que Shlain et al. (2020)) qui exposent une syntaxe conviviale par exemple. Nous les utilisons pour obtenir des exemples positifs en recherchant des phrases syntaxiquement similaires aux exemples saisis par l'utilisateur. Nous appliquons cette technique aux relations de TACRED et DocRed et montrons que les modèles résultants sont compétitifs par rapport aux modèles formés sur des données annotées manuellement et sur des données obtenues à partir d'une supervision à distance. Les modèles surpassent également les modèles formés à l'aide des techniques d'augmentation des données du GNL. L'extension de l'approche basée sur la recherche avec la méthode NLG améliore encore les résultats.", 'es': 'El advenimiento de las redes neuronales en la PNL trajo consigo mejoras sustanciales en la extracción supervisada de relaciones. Sin embargo, obtener una cantidad suficiente de datos de entrenamiento sigue siendo un desafío clave. En este trabajo proponemos un proceso para iniciar conjuntos de datos de capacitación que pueden ser realizados rápidamente por personas no expertas en PNL. Aprovechamos los motores de búsqueda sobre los gráficos sintácticos (como Shlain et al. (2020)) que exponen una sintaxis amigable por ejemplo. Los utilizamos para obtener ejemplos positivos al buscar oraciones que sean sintácticamente similares a los ejemplos de entrada de usuario. Aplicamos esta técnica a las relaciones de TACRED y DocRED y demostramos que los modelos resultantes son competitivos con los modelos entrenados en datos anotados manualmente y en datos obtenidos de supervisión a distancia. Los modelos también superan a los modelos entrenados con técnicas de aumento de datos de NLG. Ampliar el enfoque basado en búsquedas con el método NLG mejora aún más los resultados.', 'ja': 'NLPにおけるニューラルネットワークの登場は、監視された関係抽出の実質的な改善をもたらした。しかし、十分な量のトレーニングデータを得ることは依然として重要な課題である。この作業では、非NLP専門家が迅速に実行できるブートストラップトレーニングデータセットのプロセスを提案します。私たちは、友好的な例示構文を公開する構文グラフ（ Shlain et al. (2020)など）よりも、検索エンジンを利用しています。これらを使用して、ユーザー入力例と構文的に類似した文を検索して、肯定的な例を取得します。この手法をTACREDとDocREDの関係に適用し、結果として得られたモデルが、手動で注釈付けされたデータと遠隔監督から得られたデータでトレーニングされたモデルと競合することを示します。モデルはまた、NLGデータ拡張技術を使用してトレーニングされたモデルを上回る性能を示します。ＮＬＧ法で検索ベースのアプローチを拡張すると、結果がさらに改善される。', 'zh': '神经网络于NLP者实质性改。 然得足之数犹一机也。 导练数集,可由非NLP速行。 吾用搜索引擎而非句法图(如Shlain et al. (2020)),语法明好示例语法。 吾辈以此索语法类用户输示例句以得正示例。 宜用于TACREDDocRED,明所得手动注数远程监督之数竞争力。 其性亦优于用 NLG 数益练者也。 用 NLG 之法,广搜索之法,可更进也。', 'ru': 'Появление нейронных сетей в NLP принесло с собой существенные улучшения в контролируемой экстракции отношений. Однако получение достаточного объема данных о профессиональной подготовке остается одной из ключевых проблем. В этой работе мы предлагаем процесс для загрузки обучающих наборов данных, которые могут быть быстро выполнены не NLP-экспертами. Мы используем поисковые системы вместо синтаксических графов (таких как Shlain et al. (2020)), которые раскрывают дружественный синтаксис. Мы используем их для получения положительных примеров путем поиска предложений, синтаксически схожих с пользовательскими примерами ввода. Мы применяем этот метод к отношениям от TACRED и DocRED и показываем, что полученные модели конкурируют с моделями, обученными на ручных аннотированных данных и на данных, полученных от дистанционного наблюдения. Модели также превосходят модели, подготовленные с использованием методов увеличения данных NLG. Расширение поискового подхода с помощью метода NLG дополнительно улучшает результаты.', 'hi': 'एनएलपी में तंत्रिका-नेटवर्क के आगमन ने पर्यवेक्षित संबंध निष्कर्षण में पर्याप्त सुधार किया। हालांकि, पर्याप्त मात्रा में प्रशिक्षण डेटा प्राप्त करना एक महत्वपूर्ण चुनौती बनी हुई है। इस काम में हम बूटस्ट्रैपिंग प्रशिक्षण डेटासेट के लिए एक प्रक्रिया का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जिसे गैर-एनएलपी-विशेषज्ञों द्वारा जल्दी से किया जा सकता है। हम वाक्यात्मक-रेखांकन (जैसे Shlain et al. (2020)) पर खोज इंजन का लाभ उठाते हैं जो एक दोस्ताना बाई-उदाहरण वाक्यविन्यास को उजागर करते हैं। हम वाक्यों की खोज करके सकारात्मक उदाहरण प्राप्त करने के लिए इनका उपयोग करते हैं जो वाक्यात्मक रूप से उपयोगकर्ता इनपुट उदाहरणों के समान हैं। हम इस तकनीक को TACRED और DocRED से संबंधों पर लागू करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि परिणामी मॉडल मैन्युअल रूप से एनोटेट किए गए डेटा पर प्रशिक्षित मॉडल और दूर के पर्यवेक्षण से प्राप्त डेटा पर प्रतिस्पर्धी हैं। मॉडल भी NLG डेटा संवर्धन तकनीकों का उपयोग कर प्रशिक्षित मॉडल outperform. NLG विधि के साथ खोज-आधारित दृष्टिकोण का विस्तार करने से परिणामों में और सुधार होता है।', 'ga': 'Tháinig feabhsuithe suntasacha ar eastóscadh caidreamh maoirsithe mar gheall ar theacht na líonraí néaracha i NLP. Mar sin féin, is príomhdhúshlán fós é cainníocht imleor sonraí oiliúna a fháil. San obair seo molaimid próiseas chun tacair shonraí oiliúna a bhrústocadh ar féidir le saineolaithe nach saineolaithe NLP iad a dhéanamh go tapa. Bainimid leas as innill chuardaigh thar ghraif chomhréire (Ar nós Shlain et al. (2020)) a nochtar comhréir cairdiúil seachshampla. Bainimid úsáid as iad seo chun samplaí dearfacha a fháil trí abairtí a chuardach atá cosúil go comhréire le samplaí ionchuir úsáideora. Cuirimid an teicníocht seo i bhfeidhm ar chaidreamh ó TACRED agus DocRED agus léirímid go bhfuil na samhlacha a bhíonn mar thoradh orthu iomaíoch le samhlacha atá oilte ar shonraí anótáilte de láimh agus ar shonraí a fhaightear ó chianmhaoirseacht. Feidhmíonn na samhlacha freisin níos fearr ná na samhlacha atá oilte ag baint úsáide as teicnící méadaithe sonraí NLG. Feabhsaítear na torthaí tuilleadh nuair a leathnaítear an cur chuige cuardaigh-bhunaithe le modh NLG.', 'ka': 'NLP-ში ნეიროლური ქსელების გამოსახულება, რომლებიც შემდეგ მნიშვნელოვანი გაუკეთესება შემდეგ შემდეგ შესახებ შესახებ გამოსახულებაში. მაგრამ საკმაოდ, საკმაოდ მნიშვნელოვანი მონაცემების მიღება უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი გამოცემები იქნება. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ პროცესი დავიწყებთ სამუშაო მონაცემების სამუშაო მონაცემების სამუშაო, რომელიც შეიძლება სწრაფად გავაკეთოთ, რომელიც ჩვენ სინტაქტიკური გრაფიკაში ძებნა მოწყობილობის გამოყენება (როგორც Shlain et al. (2020)) რომელიც საკუთარი სინტაქსის გამოყენება. ჩვენ გამოვიყენებთ ეს პოტიფიკაციური მაგალითები, რომლებიც სინტაქტიკურად გამოყენებელი გამოყენებელი მაგალითებისთვის გამოვიყენებთ. ჩვენ ამ ტექნექციას TACRED და DocRED-ის შესახებისთვის აყენებთ და ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ შემდეგ მოდელები კონპექტიურია მოდელებით, რომლებიც მანქანიურად მონიტანებული მონაცემებზე და მონაცემე მოდელები ასევე გავაკეთებენ მოდელები, რომლებიც NLG მონაცემების აგგენტაციის ტექნოგიებით გამოყენებული. NLG მეტისთვის შესაბამისათვის დაფართებული პროგრამის გაფართება შესაბამისათვის შესაბამისათვის.', 'el': 'Η έλευση των νευρωνικών δικτύων στο ΝΛΠ έφερε μαζί της σημαντικές βελτιώσεις στην εποπτευόμενη εξαγωγή σχέσεων. Ωστόσο, η απόκτηση επαρκούς ποσότητας δεδομένων κατάρτισης παραμένει βασική πρόκληση. Σε αυτή την εργασία προτείνουμε μια διαδικασία για σύνολα εκπαιδευτικών δεδομένων που μπορούν να εκτελεστούν γρήγορα από μη-εμπειρογνώμονες. Εκμεταλλευόμαστε τις μηχανές αναζήτησης σε σχέση με συντακτικά γραφήματα (όπως ο Σλέιν κ.α. (2020)) που εκθέτουν μια φιλική σύνταξη παραδειγμάτων. Τα χρησιμοποιούμε για να πάρουμε θετικά παραδείγματα αναζητώντας προτάσεις που είναι συντακτικά παρόμοια με παραδείγματα εισαγωγής χρηστών. Εφαρμόζουμε αυτή την τεχνική στις σχέσεις από το και το αποδεικνύουμε ότι τα προκύπτουσα μοντέλα είναι ανταγωνιστικά με τα μοντέλα που εκπαιδεύονται σε χειροκίνητα σχολιασμένα δεδομένα και σε δεδομένα που λαμβάνονται από μακρινή επίβλεψη. Τα μοντέλα επίσης ξεπερνούν τα μοντέλα που εκπαιδεύονται χρησιμοποιώντας τεχνικές αύξησης δεδομένων. Η επέκταση της προσέγγισης βασισμένης στην αναζήτηση με τη μέθοδο βελτιώνει περαιτέρω τα αποτελέσματα.', 'hu': 'A neurális hálózatok megjelenése az NLP-ben jelentős javulást hozott a felügyelt kapcsolatok extrakciójában. A képzési adatok elegendő mennyiségének megszerzése azonban továbbra is kulcsfontosságú kihívást jelent. Ebben a munkában javaslatot teszünk a képzési adatok rendszerindítására, amelyeket nem NLP-szakértők gyorsan elvégezhetnek. Kihasználjuk a keresőmotorokat a szintaktikus grafikonokkal szemben (mint például Shlain et al. (2020)), amelyek barátságos példaértékű szintaxist tesznek lehetővé. Ezeket arra használjuk, hogy pozitív példákat kapjunk, olyan mondatokat keresve, amelyek szintaktikusan hasonlóak a felhasználói beviteli példákhoz. Ezt a technikát a TACRED és DocRED kapcsolatokra alkalmazzuk, és megmutatjuk, hogy az így kapott modellek versenyképesek a manuálisan jegyzetelt adatokra és a távoli felügyeletből származó adatokra képzett modellekkel. A modellek az NLG adatok nagyobbításával képzett modelleket is felülmúlják. A keresési alapú megközelítés kiterjesztése az NLG módszerrel tovább javítja az eredményeket.', 'it': "L'avvento delle reti neurali nella PNL portò con sé miglioramenti sostanziali nell'estrazione supervisionata delle relazioni. Tuttavia, ottenere una quantità sufficiente di dati sulla formazione rimane una sfida fondamentale. In questo lavoro proponiamo un processo per il bootstrapping dei dataset formativi che possono essere eseguiti rapidamente da esperti non-NLP. Approfittiamo dei motori di ricerca rispetto ai grafici sintattici (come Shlain et al. (2020)) che espongono una sintassi amichevole per esempio. Usiamo questi per ottenere esempi positivi cercando frasi sintatticamente simili agli esempi di input degli utenti. Applichiamo questa tecnica alle relazioni di TACRED e DocRED e mostriamo che i modelli risultanti sono competitivi con modelli addestrati su dati annotati manualmente e su dati ottenuti da supervisione a distanza. I modelli superano anche i modelli formati utilizzando tecniche di aumento dei dati NLG. Estendere l'approccio basato sulla ricerca con il metodo NLG migliora ulteriormente i risultati.", 'lt': 'Neuralinių tinklų atsiradimas NLP padėjo gerokai pagerinti kontroliuojamų santykių gavybą. Tačiau pagrindinis uždavinys tebėra gauti pakankamai mokymo duomenų. Šiame darbe siūlome parengti mokymo duomenų rinkinius, kuriuos greitai gali atlikti ne NLP ekspertai. Mes naudojamės paieškos varikliais, o ne sintaksiniais grafikais (pvz., Shlain et al. (2020)), kurie atskleidžia draugišką, pavyzdžiui, sintaksą. We use these to obtain positive examples by searching for sentences that are syntactically similar to user input examples.  Taikome šį metodą TACRED ir DocRED santykiams ir parodome, kad gaunami modeliai yra konkurencingi su modeliais, parengtais rankiniu būdu anotuotais duomenimis ir iš tolimos priežiūros gautais duomenimis. Šie modeliai taip pat atitinka modelius, parengtus naudojant NLG duomenų didinimo metodus. Išplėsti paieškos pagrindu grindžiamą metodą taikant NLG metodą toliau gerina rezultatus.', 'kk': 'NLP-дегі невралды желілердің кездесуі бақылау қатынасының шығаруында көп жақсартуларын жасады. Бірақ оқыту деректерінің жеткілікті санын алу үшін негізгі мәселе болады. Бұл жұмыста NLP емес эксперттердің тез жұмыс істеуге болатын деректер қорларын жүктеу процесін ұсынамыз. Біз синтактикалық графиктерден іздеу тетіктерін (мысалы, Shlain et al. (2020) қолдануға арналған синтаксисі қолдануға арналған. Біз осыларды пайдаланушылардың келтіру мысалдарына синтактикалық түрде ұқсас сөздерді іздеу үшін оң жақсы мысалдар аламыз. Біз осы техниканы TACRED және DocRED қатынасына қолданып, негізгі үлгілер қолмен белгіленген деректерге және қашықтағы қашықтағы мәліметтерге қатынасыз деп көрсетедік. Үлгілер сондай-ақ NLG деректерді жақсарту техникаларымен оқылған үлгілерді жасайды. Іздеу негізінде NLG әдісімен қосылу нәтижесін жасайды.', 'mk': 'Настанокот на нервните мрежи во НЛП доведе до значителни подобрувања во надгледуваната екстракција на односите. Сепак, добивањето доволно количина податоци за обука останува клучен предизвик. Во оваа работа предложуваме процес за обука на податоците кои можат да бидат извршени брзо од експерти кои не се од НЛП. Ние ги искористуваме пребарувачките мотори преку синтактичките графики (како Шлајн и други (2020)) кои изложуваат пријателска по пример синтаксика. Ние ги користиме овие за да добиеме позитивни примери со барање на реченици кои се синтактички слични на примерите на внесување на корисникот. We apply this technique to relations from TACRED and DocRED and show that the resulting models are competitive with models trained on manually annotated data and on data obtained from distant supervision.  The models also outperform models trained using NLG data augmentation techniques.  Проширувањето на пристапот базиран на пребарување со методот НЛГ понатаму ги подобрува резултатите.', 'ms': 'Kehadiran rangkaian saraf di NLP membawa perkembangan yang besar dalam ekstraksi hubungan yang diawasi. Namun, mendapatkan kuantiti yang cukup data latihan tetap satu cabaran utama. Dalam kerja ini kami cadangkan proses untuk set data latihan bootstrapping yang boleh dilakukan dengan cepat oleh ahli-bukan-NLP. Kami mengambil keuntungan enjin carian daripada graf sintaktik (Seperti Shlain et al. (2020)) yang mengekspos sintaks ramah demi contoh. We use these to obtain positive examples by searching for sentences that are syntactically similar to user input examples.  Kami menerapkan teknik ini untuk hubungan dari TACRED dan DocRED dan menunjukkan bahawa model yang berasal adalah bersaing dengan model yang dilatih pada data yang dicatat secara manual dan pada data yang diperoleh dari pengawasan jauh. Model juga melebihi model yang dilatih menggunakan teknik peningkatan data NLG. Extending the search-based approach with the NLG method further improves the results.', 'ml': 'NLP-ലെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d ശൃംഖലങ്ങളുടെ അന്വേഷണം അതില്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട ബന്ധത്തിന്റെ പുറത്ത് നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട എന്നാലും, പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d മതിയായ പരിശീലനം ലഭിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വ്യ ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ബൂട്ട്\u200cട്രാങ്കിങ് ട്രെയിനിങ്ങ് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു പ്രക്രിയോഗം പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക് സിന്റാക്റ്റിക്ക് ഗ്രാഫ്സിനെക്കാള്\u200d തെരച്ചില്\u200d എഞ്ചിനുകള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു (Shlain et al. (2020) ഉദാഹരണമായ ഒരു സിന്\u200dടാക ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടിന്റെ ഉദാഹരണങ്ങളെപ്പോലെയുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d തെരയുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഇതുപോലെയാണ് ഉപ ടാക്രിഡിയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഡോക്രിഡിയില്\u200d നിന്നും ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ ടെക്നിക്ക് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു എന്നിട്ട് കാണിക്കുന്നത് അനുഭവിക്കുന NLG ഡേറ്റാ ആഗ്രഹിക്കുന്ന സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകളും പുറത്തുകടക്കുന്നു. Extending the search-based approach with the NLG method further improves the results.', 'no': 'Utviklinga av neuralnettverk i NLP førte med det store forbedringar i oversikte utpakking av relasjonar. Det er imidlertid ein nøkkelutfordring for å få nok mykje opplæringsdata. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi ein prosess for oppstartsprøysingsdata som kan utførast raskt av ikkje-NLP-ekspertar. Vi bruker forsøkmotorar over syntaktiske grafikk (slik som Shlain et al. (2020)) som eksponerar eit vennlig syntaks for eksempel. Vi brukar desse for å få positiv eksemplar ved å søkja etter setningar som er syntaksisk liknande med eksemplar for brukaren. Vi bruker denne teknikken til relasjonar frå TACRED og DocRED og viser at resultatet modelane er konkurrente med modelane trengte på manuelt merkte data og om data fått frå ekstern oversikt. Modellene utfører også modeller som trengte med NLG-dataaugmentasjonsteknologikar. Utvida søkebasert tilnærming med NLG-metoden forbetrar resultatet.', 'pl': 'Pojawienie się sieci neuronowych w NLP przyniosło ze sobą znaczną poprawę w ekstrakcji relacji nadzorowanych. Jednak uzyskanie wystarczającej ilości danych szkoleniowych pozostaje kluczowym wyzwaniem. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy proces bootstrappingu zestawów danych szkoleniowych, który może być szybko przeprowadzony przez ekspertów nie-NLP. Wykorzystujemy wyszukiwarki w stosunku do wykresów składni (np. Shlain et al. (2020)), które ujawniają przyjazną składnię przykładową. Używamy ich do uzyskania pozytywnych przykładów poprzez wyszukiwanie zdań, które są składniowo podobne do przykładów wejściowych użytkowników. Stosujemy tę technikę do relacji z TACRED i DocRED i pokazujemy, że powstałe modele są konkurencyjne z modelami szkolonymi na ręcznie anotowanych danych oraz na danych uzyskanych z odległego nadzoru. Modele przewyższają również modele przeszkolone przy użyciu technik powiększania danych NLG. Rozszerzenie podejścia opartego na wyszukiwaniu metodą NLG jeszcze bardziej poprawia wyniki.', 'mn': 'NLP-ын мэдрэлийн сүлжээний ирээдүйд харилцааны хамааралтай хамааралтай сайжруулалт гарч ирсэн. Гэвч хангалттай хэмжээний сургалтын мэдээллийг авч үзэх нь чухал сорилт. Энэ ажил дээр бид NLP биш мэргэжилтнүүд хурдан хийж чадна дасгал өгөгдлийн сангийн сургалтын хөгжүүлэх процессийг санал дэвшүүлнэ. Бид синтактик график дээр хайлтын моторуудыг ашиглан ашигладаг (Жишээ нь Shlain et al. (2020) гэдэг нь найзуудын жишээ нь синтаксикийг ашигладаг. Бид эдгээрийг хэрэглэгчийн орлуулах жишээнтэй адилхан өгүүлбөрүүдийг хайж эерэг жишээг гаргаж авдаг. Бид энэ техникыг TACRED болон DocRED-ын харилцаанд ашиглаж, үр дүнтэй загварууд нь гар давтагдсан өгөгдлийн талаар болон хол давтагдсан өгөгдлийн талаар өрсөлдөг загваруудыг харуулж байна. Мөн загварууд нь NLG өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэлтийн технологи ашиглан сургалтын загваруудыг дамжуулдаг. НLG аргаар хайлтын үндсэн аргыг нэмэгдүүлэх нь үр дүнг илүү сайжруулдаг.', 'ro': 'Apariția rețelelor neurale în PNL a adus cu ea îmbunătățiri substanțiale în extracția relațiilor supravegheate. Cu toate acestea, obținerea unei cantități suficiente de date privind formarea rămâne o provocare esențială. În această lucrare propunem un proces pentru bootstraping seturi de date de instruire care pot fi efectuate rapid de către non-experți NLP. Profităm de motoarele de căutare față de grafice sintactice (cum ar fi Shlain et al. (2020)) care expun o sintaxă prietenoasă de exemplu. Folosim acestea pentru a obține exemple pozitive prin căutarea unor propoziții care sunt similare sintactic cu exemplele de introducere a utilizatorilor. Aplicăm această tehnică relațiilor TACRED și DocRED și demonstrăm că modelele rezultate sunt competitive cu modelele instruite pe date adnotate manual și pe datele obținute din supravegherea la distanță. Modelele depășesc, de asemenea, modelele instruite folosind tehnici de augmentare a datelor NLG. Extinderea abordării bazate pe căutare cu metoda NLG îmbunătățește și mai mult rezultatele.', 'sr': 'Došlost neuralnih mreža u NLP-u donela je značajno poboljšanje u nadzornom izvlačenju odnosa. Međutim, dobivanje dovoljno količine podataka o obuci ostaje ključni izazov. U ovom poslu predlažemo proces za obuku podataka koji se brzo može izvršiti ne-NLP stručnjaci. Koristimo pretraživačke motore preko sintaktičkih grafika (kao što je Shlain et al. (2020)) koji otkrivaju prijateljsku sintaksu po primjeru. Koristimo ovo da dobijemo pozitivne primjere tražeći rečenice koje su sintaktički slične primjerima ulaska korisnika. Primjenjujemo ovu tehniku odnosima od TACRED i DocRED i pokazujemo da su rezultatni modeli konkurentni sa modelima obučenim na ruèno annotiranim podacima i podacima koje su dobile od dalekog nadzora. Modeli su takođe nadmašili i modele obučene koristeći tehnike povećanja podataka NLG. Proširenje pristupa na temelju pretraživanja metodom NLG bolje poboljšava rezultate.', 'so': 'Cibaadada shabakada neurada ee NLP waxay keeneen hagaajinta aad u weyn ee la ilaaliyo soo bixinta xiriirka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee helitaanka qiyaastii waxbarashada ku filan waa dhibaato muhiim ah. Shuqulkaas ayaannu u diyaarinaynaa koorasyada waxbarashada aasaasiga ah, kaas oo dhaqso u sameyn kara khabiir aan aheyn AMLP. Masiiniinka raadinta waxaan ka isticmaalaynaa wax ka mid ah sahlain al(2020), kaasoo tusaale ahaan u muuqata kaalmada saynetiga. Waxaynu u isticmaalnaa tusaalooyin positive ah si aan ugu raadinno imtixaamo u eg tusaalayaasha input. Waxaannu isticmaalaynaa xiriirka TACRED iyo DocRED waxaana tusinaynaa in qaababka soo socda ay u khilaafsan yihiin modelalka lagu baray macluumaadka si gacan ah loo isticmaalay iyo macluumaadka laga helay meel fog. Tusaalada waxaa sidoo kale ku qoran qaabab lagu tababariyey isticmaalka qalabka kordhiska danaha NLG. Ka bixinta qaababka raadinta oo ku saleysan qaababka NLG ayaa kordhiya dhamaadka.', 'si': 'NLP වලින් න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලයේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සමඟ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ඇතුල් කරලා තියෙන්නේ. නමුත්, ප්\u200dරධාන දත්ත ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ගන්න පුළුවන් අවශ්\u200dයයක් තියෙනවා. මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් යෝජනා කරනවා නැති NLP-විශ්වාසිකයෙන් ඉක්මනින් කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. අපි සොයාගැනීමේ ඉංජින් වලට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා සංකේතික-ග්\u200dරාෆික් වලින් (ශ්ලේන් ට් ල්. අපි මේවා භාවිත කරනවා වාර්තාත්මක උදාහරණයක් ලැබෙන්න සඳහා වාර්තාත්මක වෙනුවෙන් වචනය හොයාගන්න. අපි මේ තාක්ෂණය TACRED සහ DocRED වලින් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ඒ වගේම පෙන්වන්නේ අනුප්\u200dරයෝජනය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝ මොඩේල් වලින් NLG දත්ත විශාලනය විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන මොඩේල් වඩා ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා. NLG විධානය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා විස්තර කරන්න ප', 'ta': 'NLP இல் உள்ள புதிய வலைப்பின்னல்களின் வழக்கம் அதை கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட தொடர்பு பெறுதலில் மிகப்பெரிய முன்னேற்றங்கள ஆயினும், பயிற்சி தரவை பெறுவதற்கு போதுமான அளவு முக்கியமான சவால் இருக்கிறது. இந்த வேலையில் நாம் துவங்கும் பயிற்சி தகவல் அமைப்புகளுக்கு ஒரு செயல்பாட்டை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது NLP- விசைவ நாம் தேடும் இயந்திரங்களை ஒத்திசைவு வரைபடங்களை மேல் பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் (Shlain et al. (2020) இது ஒரு நண்பர் உதாரணமாக ஒத்திசைவை வெளியிட நாம் இதை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் பயன்படுத்துபவர் உள்ளீடு உதாரணங்களைப் போன்ற வாக்கியங்களைத் தேடுகிறோம். We apply this technique to relations from TACRED and DocRED and show that the resulting models are competitive with models trained on manually annotated data and on data obtained from distant supervision.  Name NLG முறைமையைக் கொண்டு தேடும் அடிப்படையில் செயல்பாட்டை மேலும் முடிவுகளை மேம்படுத்துகிறது.', 'sv': 'Införandet av neurala nätverk i NLP medförde betydande förbättringar i övervakad relationsextraktion. En viktig utmaning är dock att få fram tillräckligt många utbildningsdata. I detta arbete föreslår vi en process för bootstrapping av träningsdataset som kan utföras snabbt av icke-NLP-experter. Vi utnyttjar sökmotorer framför syntaktiska grafer (såsom Shlain et al. (2020)) som exponerar en vänlig by-example syntax. Vi använder dessa för att få positiva exempel genom att söka efter meningar som är syntaktiskt liknande användarinmatningsexempel. Vi tillämpar denna teknik på relationer från TACRED och DocRED och visar att de resulterande modellerna är konkurrenskraftiga med modeller utbildade på manuellt kommenterade data och på data erhållna från fjärrövervakning. Modellerna presterar också bättre än modeller som tränats med hjälp av NLG data augmentation tekniker. Genom att utöka det sökbaserade tillvägagångssättet med NLG-metoden förbättras resultaten ytterligare.', 'ur': 'NLP میں نیورل-نیٹورک کی آگئی اس کے ساتھ بہت سی سیدھی اضافہ کی۔ However, obtaining a sufficient quantity of training data remains a key challenge. ہم اس کام میں ایک پروسس پیش کریں گے کہ بوٹ سٹرپٹ ٹرینگ ڈیٹ سٹ کے لئے جو غیر NLP متخصص کے ذریعے جلد عمل کر سکتے ہیں۔ ہم سینٹکتیک-گراف پر جستجو انجینں کا فائدہ اٹھاتے ہیں (جیسے Shlain et al. (2020)، جو ایک دوستی مثال سینٹکس کو ظاہر کرتے ہیں۔ ہم ان کو مثبت مثالیں حاصل کرنے کے لئے استعمال کرتے ہیں جو مثالیں حاصل کر رہے ہیں جو مثالیں حاصل کر رہے ہیں۔ ہم اس تکنیک کو TACRED اور DocRED سے رابطہ پر لازم کرتے ہیں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ نتیجہ موڈلے اپنے ہاتھ سے دکھائے ہوئے ڈاٹے اور دور کی نظر سے ملے ہوئے ڈاٹے پر مطابق ہیں نمڈلوں نے بھی NLG ڈیٹا افزایش ٹیکنیک کے مطابق استعمال کئے ہوئے نمڈلوں سے استعمال کئے ہیں۔ NLG روش کے ساتھ تلاش کی بنیادی طریقہ کو اضافہ کرنا نتائج کو اضافہ کرتا ہے.', 'mt': 'Il-ħolqien ta’ netwerks newrali fil-NLP ġab miegħu titjib sostanzjali fl-estrazzjoni ta’ relazzjonijiet supervizzati. Madankollu, il-kisba ta’ kwantità suffiċjenti ta’ dejta dwar it-taħriġ tibqa’ sfida ewlenija. In this work we propose a process for bootstrapping training datasets which can be performed quickly by non-NLP-experts.  We take advantage of search engines over syntactic-graphs (Such as Shlain et al. (2020)) which expose a friendly by-example syntax.  We use these to obtain positive examples by searching for sentences that are syntactically similar to user input examples.  Aħna napplikaw din it-teknika għar-relazzjonijiet minn TACRED u DocRED u nuru li l-mudelli li jirriżultaw huma kompetittivi ma’ mudelli mħarrġa fuq dejta annotata manwalment u fuq dejta miksuba minn superviżjoni remota. The models also outperform models trained using NLG data augmentation techniques.  L-estensjoni tal-approċċ ibbażat fuq it-tiftix bil-metodu NLG tkompli ttejjeb ir-riżultati.', 'uz': "Name Lekin, taʼminlovchi maʼlumotning qiymatiga yetarli bo'lishi mumkin. In this work we propose a process for bootstrapping training datasets which can be performed quickly by non-NLP-experts.  Biz sintaktik grafiklardan foydalanamiz (Shlain et al(2020)) va masalan sintaktik bilan foydalanuvchimiz. Biz buni yaxshi misollar olish uchun foydalanuvchi kiritish misollarini qidirish uchun foydalanamiz. Biz bu teknikani TACRED va DocRED bilan bog'liqlariga qo'llangan maʼlumotlar bilan o'rganish modellari bilan murojaat qilamiz va masofadagi taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar bilan ishlab chiqaradi. Name @ info: status", 'vi': 'Sự xuất hiện của các mạng thần kinh tại Njala đem lại những cải tiến đáng kể trong việc tách rời mối quan hệ giám sát. Tuy nhiên, kiếm được một lượng dữ liệu về huấn luyện vừa đủ vẫn là một thách thức. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị một tiến trình cho bộ dữ liệu huấn luyện sơ bộ có thể được thực hiện nhanh chóng bởi các chuyên gia không. Chúng tôi tận dụng cơ chế tìm kiếm hơn các biểu đồ cú pháp (như Shlain et al. (2020) để lộ ra cú pháp gương mẫu thân thiện. Chúng tôi sử dụng chúng để có ví dụ tích cực bằng cách tìm câu theo cấu trúc tương tự với ví dụ nhập người dùng. Chúng tôi áp dụng kỹ thuật này cho các mối quan hệ giữa TARED và DocRED và cho thấy các mô hình kết quả cạnh tranh với các mô hình được huấn luyện bằng tay và các dữ liệu được lấy từ sự giám sát xa. Các mẫu cũng cung cấp các mẫu được huấn luyện bằng kỹ thuật gia tăng dữ liệu NLG. Sự mở rộng phương pháp dựa trên tìm kiếm với phương pháp NILG cải thiện thêm kết quả.', 'bg': 'Появата на невронните мрежи в НЛП донесе значителни подобрения в контролираното извличане на релации. Получаването на достатъчно количество данни за обучението обаче остава основно предизвикателство. В тази работа предлагаме процес за зареждане на набори от данни за обучение, който може да бъде изпълнен бързо от неексперти. Възползваме се от търсачките пред синтактичните графики (като Шлайн и др. (2020), които излагат приятелски синтаксис по пример. Използваме ги, за да получим положителни примери, като търсим изречения, които са синтактично подобни на примерите за въвеждане на потребителя. Прилагаме тази техника към отношенията от ТАКРЕД и ДокРЕД и показваме, че получените модели са конкурентни с модели, обучени на ръчно анотирани данни и на данни, получени от дистанционен надзор. Моделите също надминават моделите, обучени с помощта на техники за увеличаване на данните. Разширяването на базирания на търсенето подход с метода допълнително подобрява резултатите.', 'hr': 'Dolazak neuralnih mreža u NLP-u donio je s njom značajno poboljšanje nadzornog izvlačenja odnosa. Međutim, dobivanje dovoljno količine podataka o obuci ostaje ključni izazov. U ovom poslu predlažemo proces za obuku podataka koji se brzo može izvršiti stručnjaci bez NLP-a. Koristimo pretraživačke motore preko sintaktičkih grafika (poput Shlain et al. (2020)) koji izlaže prijateljsku po primjeru sintaksu. Koristimo ovo da dobijemo pozitivne primjere tražeći rečenice koje su sintaktički slične primjerima ulaska korisnika. Primjenjujemo ovu tehniku odnosima TACRED i DocRED-a i pokazujemo da su rezultatni modeli konkurentni s modelima obučenim na ručno annotiranim podacima i podacima dobivenim od daljinog nadzora. Modeli su također nadmašili i modele obučene koristeći tehnike povećanja podataka NLG. Proširenje pristupa na temelju pretraživanja metodom NLG dodatno poboljšava rezultate.', 'da': 'Fremkomsten af neurale netværk i NLP medførte betydelige forbedringer i overvåget relationsudvinding. Men det er fortsat en vigtig udfordring at opnå en tilstrækkelig mængde uddannelsesdata. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en proces til bootstrapping af træningsdatasæt, som kan udføres hurtigt af ikke-NLP-eksperter. Vi drager fordel af søgemaskiner frem for syntaktiske grafer (såsom Shlain et al. (2020)) som udsætter en venlig by-eksempel syntaks. Vi bruger disse til at opnå positive eksempler ved at søge efter sætninger, der ligner syntaktisk brugerinput eksempler. Vi anvender denne teknik på relationer fra TACRED og DocRED og viser, at de resulterende modeller er konkurrencedygtige med modeller trænet på manuelt annoterede data og på data opnået ved fjernovervågning. Modellerne overgår også modeller uddannet ved hjælp af NLG data augmentation teknikker. Udvidelsen af den søgebaserede tilgang med NLG-metoden forbedrer resultaterne yderligere.', 'nl': 'De komst van neurale netwerken in NLP bracht aanzienlijke verbeteringen met zich mee in supervised relation extraction. Het verkrijgen van voldoende opleidingsgegevens blijft echter een belangrijke uitdaging. In dit werk stellen we een proces voor voor bootstrapping trainingsdatasets die snel kunnen worden uitgevoerd door niet-NLP-experts. We maken gebruik van zoekmachines ten opzichte van syntactische grafieken (zoals Shlain et al. (2020)) die een vriendelijke by-example syntaxis blootleggen. We gebruiken deze om positieve voorbeelden te verkrijgen door te zoeken naar zinnen die syntactisch vergelijkbaar zijn met gebruikersinvoervoorbeelden. We passen deze techniek toe op relaties uit TACRED en DocRED en laten zien dat de resulterende modellen concurrerend zijn met modellen die getraind zijn op handmatig geannoteerde gegevens en op gegevens verkregen uit toezicht op afstand. De modellen presteren ook beter dan modellen die zijn getraind met behulp van NLG data augmentation technieken. Het uitbreiden van de search-based aanpak met de NLG methode verbetert de resultaten verder.', 'de': 'Das Aufkommen neuronaler Netze in NLP brachte erhebliche Verbesserungen in der überwachten Beziehungsextraktion mit sich. Die Beschaffung einer ausreichenden Menge an Trainingsdaten bleibt jedoch eine zentrale Herausforderung. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir einen Prozess für Bootstrapping Trainingsdatensätze vor, der von Nicht-NLP-Experten schnell durchgeführt werden kann. Wir nutzen Suchmaschinen gegenüber Syntaktik-Graphen (wie Shlain et al. (2020)), die eine freundliche Beispielsyntax zeigen. Wir verwenden diese, um positive Beispiele zu erhalten, indem wir nach Sätzen suchen, die syntaktisch ähnlich sind wie Benutzereingabebeispiele. Wir wenden diese Technik auf Relationen von TACRED und DocRED an und zeigen, dass die resultierenden Modelle mit Modellen konkurrieren, die auf manuell annotierten Daten und auf Daten aus Fernüberwachung trainiert werden. Die Modelle übertreffen auch Modelle, die mit NLG-Datenerweiterungstechniken trainiert wurden. Die Erweiterung des suchbasierten Ansatzes um die NLG-Methode verbessert die Ergebnisse weiter.', 'id': 'Kemunculan jaringan saraf di NLP membawa perubahan yang besar dalam ekstraksi hubungan yang diawasi. However, obtaining a sufficient quantity of training data remains a key challenge.  Dalam pekerjaan ini kami mengusulkan proses untuk bootstrapping dataset pelatihan yang dapat dilakukan dengan cepat oleh ahli non-NLP. Kami mengambil keuntungan dari mesin pencarian daripada grafik sintaks (Seperti Shlain et al. (2020)) yang mengekspos sintaks ramah per contoh. Kami menggunakan ini untuk mendapatkan contoh positif dengan mencari kalimat yang secara sintaks mirip contoh input pengguna. Kami menerapkan teknik ini untuk hubungan dari TACRED dan DocRED dan menunjukkan bahwa model hasilnya kompetitif dengan model yang dilatih pada data yang dicatat secara manual dan pada data yang diperoleh dari pengawasan jauh. Model juga melebihi model yang dilatih menggunakan teknik peningkatan data NLG. Meluaskan pendekatan berdasarkan pencarian dengan metode NLG lebih memperbaiki hasilnya.', 'ko': '자연 언어 처리에서 신경 네트워크의 출현은 감독 관계 추출에 실질적인 개선을 가져왔다.그러나 충분한 훈련 데이터를 얻는 것은 여전히 관건적인 도전이다.이 작업에서 우리는 NLP 전문가가 아닌 사람이 신속하게 실행할 수 있도록 훈련 데이터 집합을 유도하는 과정을 제시했다.우리는 문법도 (예: Shlain et al. (2020) 가 아닌 검색엔진을 이용하여 우호적인 예시 문법을 보여 준다.우리는 사용자 입력 예시와 문법적으로 비슷한 문장을 검색해서 긍정적인 예시를 얻는다.우리는 이 기술을 TACRED와 DocRED의 관계에 응용하고 생성된 모델과 수동 주석 데이터와 원격 모니터링 데이터를 바탕으로 하는 훈련 모델이 경쟁력이 있음을 나타낸다.이들 모델의 성능도 NLG 데이터 증강 기술로 훈련된 모델보다 우수하다.NLG 방법으로 검색 기반의 방법을 확장하여 결과를 더욱 개선시켰다.', 'fa': 'توسعه شبکه\u200cهای عصبی در NLP با آن توسعه\u200cهای زیادی در استخراج ارتباط تحت نظر قرار گرفته است. با این حال، به اندازه کافی از اطلاعات آموزش، یک چالش کلید باقی مانده است. در این کار، ما یک فرایند برای تعلیم داده\u200cهای آموزشی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که توسط دانشمندان غیر NLP سریع انجام می\u200cشود. ما از موتورهای جستجویی بر روی گرافهای سنتاکتیک استفاده می کنیم (مثل Shlain et al. (۲۰۰۲)، که یک سنتاکس با مثال دوستی را نشان می دهد. ما از اینها استفاده می کنیم تا مثالهای مثبتی را با جستجویی برای جمله\u200cها که به طور ساده شبیه به مثالهای ورودی کاربر هستند برسیم. ما این تکنیک را برای رابطه\u200cهای TACRED و DocRED استفاده می\u200cکنیم و نشان می\u200cدهیم که مدل\u200cهای نتیجه\u200cای با مدل\u200cهای آموزش داده\u200cهای دستی و داده\u200cهای از نظارت دور دریافت شده\u200cاند رقابت کننده\u200cاند. مدل\u200cها هم از مدل\u200cهای آموزش با استفاده از تکنیک افزایش داده\u200cهای NLG استفاده می\u200cکنند. افزایش روش بر اساس جستجو با روش NLG نتیجه\u200cها را بهتر می\u200cکند.', 'sw': 'Tovuti ya mitandao ya kijamii ya NLP ilileta maendeleo makubwa katika ufuatiliaji wa mahusiano. Hata hivyo, kupata kiasi cha kutosha cha taarifa za mafunzo bado ni changamoto muhimu. Katika kazi hii tunapendekeza mchakato wa kuweka taarifa za mafunzo ambazo zinaweza kutekelezwa haraka na wataalam wasio na NLP. Tunatumia miundombinu ya kutafuta zaidi ya picha za ushirikiano (kama vile Shlain et al. (2020)) inayoonyesha hisia za urafiki kwa mfano. We use these to obtain positive examples by searching for sentences that are syntactically similar to user input examples.  Tunatumia teknolojia hii kwa uhusiano wa TACRED na DocRED na kuonyesha kuwa mitindo ya matokeo yanajitihada na mifano inayofundishwa kwa manufaa na taarifa zinazopatikana kutoka kwa ufuatiliaji wa mbali. Mradi huo pia hufanya mbinu zilizofundishwa kwa kutumia mbinu za kuongeza data za NLG. Kuongeza mbinu za kutafuta kwa njia ya NLG zinazozidi kuboresha matokeo yake.', 'tr': "NLP'de näral-aýtlaryň geleni gözetli baglaşyklaryň açylmagynda örän gowurak gelişmeleri bilen getirdi. Ýöne ýeterlik sanly okuw maglumaty almak wajyp kynçylyk bolup dur. Bu işde NLP-uzmanlaryň ýüzünde çalt edip biljek maglumaty terjime etmek üçin bir proses teklip edip bilýäris. Syýahat motorlaryny sintaktik-grafiklerinden ýüze ulanýarys (Şlain et al. (2020)) mysal görä dost bir syntaksis bilen tanyşýarlar Biz bunlary ulanýarys, sözleriň sözleriň sintaktik görnüş misallerine meňzeş ýaly sözleri gözlemek üçin pozitif mysal tapylýarys. Biz bu teknikiýany TACRED we DocRED-iň ilişkilerine geçirip, netijeli modelleriň elle näsazlany veri we uzakdan gözetlendirilen maglumatlar bilen duşuşyklygyny görkez. Bu nusgalar hem NLG maglumaty bejermek teknikleri ullanýan nusgalary çykarýar. Arama tarlasyny NLG yöntemi bilen uzatlaşdyrylyp netijeleri çözýär.", 'am': 'በNLP ውስጥ የኔሩአዊ መረብ ጥናት በተጠበቀው ግንኙነት አካባቢ ማድረግ አመጣው፡፡ ነገር ግን የሞላው የድምፅ ዳራዎችን ለማግኘት የቁጥጥር ፈቃድ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ ውስጥ የNLP-Expert ፈጥኖ የሚደረገውን የድምፅ ማህበረሰብ ዳታዎችን ለመጀመሪያ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ የፍላጎት ኢንተርናዎችን በተመሳሳይ ቀለም (እንደ Shlain et al. (2020)) የሚጠቅመውን ፍጥረት እናጠቃለን፡፡ እነዚህንም ምሳሌዎችን ለመግኘት በተቃውሞ እንደተጠቃሚ ምሳሌዎችን ለመፈለግ እናስጠጋለን፡፡ ይህንን ቴክኖክን ከTACRED እና ከDocRED ግንኙነት እና ፍላጎቹ ሞዴሎችን በጅማት የተጠቃሚ ዳራዎችን እና ከሩቅ ጉዳይ የተገኘውን ዳታዎችን እናሳያልን፡፡ ሞዴሎቹ ደግሞ የNLG ዳታ አካባቢ ስልጣናዎችን ለመጠቀም ሞዴላዎችን ያስተካክላሉ። የNLG ሥርዓት መጠን በመስመር ላይ የተመሳሳይ ሥርዓት እየጨመረ ፍሬዎቹን አሻራለች፡፡', 'af': "Die voorkoms van neuralnetwerke in NLP het daarmee vaste verbeteringe gebring in ondersoekte verhouding uitvoer. Maar die ontvang van 'n genoeg hoeveelheid onderwerp data bly 'n sleutel uitdrukking. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n proses vir opstarting onderwerp datastelle wat vinnig kan uitgevoer word deur non-NLP-eksperte. Ons neem voordeel van soektog masjiene oor sintaktike-grafieke (soos Shlain et al. (2020)) wat 'n vriendelike by-voorbeeld sintaks uitspreek. Ons gebruik hierdie voorbeelde om positiewe voorbeelde te kry deur soek na setnings wat sintaktiek gelyk is aan gebruiker invoer voorbeelde. Ons het hierdie tekniks aangepas na verhouding van TACRED en DocRED en vertoon dat die resulteerde modele kompetief is met modele opgelei op Hand aangetekende data en op data ontvang van afgeleë supervisie. Die modele is ook uitgevoer van modele wat onderwerp word deur NLG data augmentasie tekniks. Verlenging van die soektog-gebaseerde toegang met die NLG-metode verder verbeter die resultate.", 'sq': 'Erdhja e rrjeteve nervore në NLP solli me vete përmirësime thelbësore në nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve të mbikqyrura. Megjithatë, marrja e një sasie të mjaftueshme të dhënash të trainimit mbetet një sfidë kryesore. Në këtë punë ne propozojmë një proces për trajnimin e grupeve të dhënash që mund të kryehen shpejt nga ekspertë jo-NLP. We take advantage of search engines over syntactic-graphs (Such as Shlain et al. (2020)) which expose a friendly by-example syntax.  Ne i përdorim këto për të marrë shembuj pozitiv duke kërkuar për fraza që janë sintaktikisht të ngjashme me shembujt e hyrjes së përdoruesit. Ne e aplikojmë këtë teknikë ndaj marrëdhënieve nga TACRED dhe DocRED dhe tregojmë se modelet që rezultojnë janë konkurrues me modelet e stërvitura në të dhënat e anotuara manualisht dhe në të dhënat e marra nga mbikqyrja e largët. Modelet kryejnë gjithashtu modele të trajnuara duke përdorur teknikat e rritjes së të dhënave NLG. Përzgjerimi i qasjes bazuar në kërkim me metodën NLG përmirëson më tej rezultatet.', 'az': "NLP'deki nöral-ağlarının gəlməsi, bununla gözləyirlən ilişkisi çıxarmaqda çox yaxşılıqlar gətirdi. Lakin təhsil məlumatlarının yeterli qiyməti alması anahtar çətinlikdir. Bu işdə NLP-dən olmayan ekspertlər tələb edə biləcək təhsil qurmaq üçün bir proses təklif edirik. Biz sintaktik grafiklərin üstündə arama motorlarından istifadə edirik (Shlain et al. (2020) ki, bir məsəl sintaksi ilə dostluğu göstərər. Biz bunları istifadəçi giriş misallarına sintaktik olaraq bənzər cümlələr axtarıb pozitif misallar almaq üçün istifadə edirik. Biz bu tekniki TACRED və DocRED əlaqələrinə uyğun edirik və göstəririk ki, sonuçlarının modellərin əlində bildirilmiş məlumatlar və uzaq gözləmədən alınmış məlumatlar barəsindəki modellərlə müqayisədir. Modellər də NLG veri artırma teknikləri ilə təhsil edilmiş modellərdən üstün gəlir. NLG metodları ilə arama tərzini artırmaq sonuçlarını artırar.", 'bn': 'এনএলপিতে নিউরেল-নেটওয়ার্কের প্রতিযোগিতা তার সাথে পরিচালিত সম্পর্ক নির্বাচনের পরিবর্তনের বিশাল উন্নতি নিয়ে এস তবে প্রশিক্ষণের পরিমাণ প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য পেতে পারে তা একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ চ্যালেঞ্জ। এই কাজে আমরা বুটস্ট্র্যাপিং ট্রেনিং ডাটাসেটের জন্য একটি প্রস্তাব প্রস্তাব করি যা এনএলপি-বিশেষজ্ঞদের দ্রুত প আমরা সার্চ ইঞ্জিনের সুবিধা ব্যবহার করি (যেমন শ্লেইনেট আল (২০২০)) যা একটি বন্ধুত্বপূর্ণ সিন্ট্যাক্স প্রকাশ করে। আমরা এগুলো ব্যবহার করি ব্যবহারকারীর ইনপুটের অনুরূপ অনুরোধ করে ইতিবাচক উদাহরণ পাওয়ার জন্য। আমরা ট্যাক্রিডি এবং ডক্রিডি থেকে সম্পর্কের জন্য এই প্রযুক্তিটি প্রয়োগ করি এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে ফলাফলের মডেল নিজেদের হাতে প্রশিক্ষিত তথ্য এবং দূরবর এনএলজি ডাটা অ্যাগ্যাগমেন্টিং কৌশল ব্যবহার করে মডেলগুলো প্রশিক্ষণ করা হয়েছে। Extending the search-based approach with the NLG method further improves the results.', 'hy': 'Նյարդային ցանցերի հայտնաբերումը ՆԼՊ-ում բերեց նշանակալի բարելավումներ վերահսկվող հարաբերությունների վերացման մեջ: Այնուամենայնիվ, բավարար քանակությամբ ուսուցման տվյալներ ստանալը դեռևս հիմնական մարտահրավեր է: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք մի գործընթաց, որպեսզի սկսենք ուսումնասիրել տվյալների համակարգերը, որոնք կարող են արագ կատարվել ոչ-ՆԼՊ-մասնագետների կողմից: Մենք օգտագործում ենք փնտրող շարժիչները սինտակտիկ գրաֆիկների (ինչպիսիք են Շլան և այլն։ (2020 թ․․․) միջոցով, որոնք բացահայտում են ընկերական օրինակի սինտաքս։ Մենք օգտագործում ենք դրանք դրական օրինակներ ստանալու համար՝ փնտրելով նախադասություններ, որոնք սինտակտիկապես նման են օգտագործողի մուտքագրման օրինակներին: Մենք կիրառում ենք այս տեխնիկան Թաքրեդի և Դոկրեդի հարաբերություններին և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ արդյունքում ստացված մոդելները մրցակցում են ձեռքով գրված տվյալների և հեռավոր վերահսկողության արդյունքում ստացված տվյալների հետ: Մոդելները նաև արտադրում են մոդելներ, որոնք սովորեցվել են օգտագործելով ՆԼԳ տվյալների աճի մեթոդներ: ՆԼԳ մեթոդի օգնությամբ ուսումնասիրությամբ հիմնված մոտեցումը ավելի լավ է բարելավում արդյունքները:', 'cs': 'Příchod neuronových sítí v NLP s sebou přinesl výrazné zlepšení v extrakci supervisovaných vztahů. Získání dostatečného množství údajů o tréninku však zůstává klíčovou výzvou. V této práci navrhujeme proces pro bootstrapping tréninkových dat, který lze rychle provést i non-NLP-experty. Využíváme vyhledávačů před syntaktickými grafy (například Shlain et al. (2020)), které vystavují přátelskou syntaxi. Používáme je k získání pozitivních příkladů hledáním vět, které jsou syntakticky podobné uživatelským vstupním příkladům. Tuto techniku aplikujeme na vztahy z TACRED a DocRED a ukazujeme, že výsledné modely jsou konkurenceschopné modelům trénovaným na ručně anotovaných datech a na datech získaných ze vzdáleného dohledu. Modely také překonávají modely trénované pomocí technik rozšíření dat NLG. Rozšíření přístupu založeného na vyhledávání metodou NLG dále zlepšuje výsledky.', 'bs': 'Dolazak neuralnih mreža u NLP-u donio je s njim značajno poboljšanje u izvlačenju nadzornih odnosa. Međutim, dobivanje dovoljno količine podataka o obuci ostaje ključni izazov. U ovom poslu predlažemo proces za obuku podataka podataka koji se brzo može izvršiti od strane stručnjaka bez NLP-a. Koristimo pretraživačke motore preko sintaktičkih grafika (kao što je Shlain et al. (2020)) koji otkrivaju prijateljsku po primjeru sintaksu. Koristimo ovo da dobijemo pozitivne primjere tražeći rečenice koje su sintaktički slične primjerima ulaska korisnika. Primjenjujemo ovu tehniku odnosima od TACRED i DocRED i pokazujemo da su rezultatni modeli konkurentni sa modelima obučenim na manuelno annotiranim podacima i podacima koje su dobile od dalekog nadzora. Modeli su također nadmašili i modele obučene koristeći tehnike povećanja podataka NLG. Proširenje pristupa na temelju pretraživanja metodom NLG dodatno poboljšava rezultate.', 'et': 'Närvivõrkude tekkimine NLP-s tõi kaasa märkimisväärse paranemise järelevalvega seotud ekstraheerimisel. Piisava koguse koolitusandmete hankimine on siiski peamine väljakutse. Selles töös pakume välja bootstrapping koolituse andmekogumite protsessi, mida saavad kiiresti teostada mitte-NLP-eksperdid. Kasutame otsingumootoreid süntaktiliste graafikute asemel (nt Shlain jt. (2020)), mis paljastavad sõbraliku näidise süntaksi. Me kasutame neid positiivsete näidete saamiseks, otsides lauseid, mis on süntaktiliselt sarnased kasutaja sisendi näidetega. Rakendame seda tehnikat TACREDi ja DocREDi suhetele ning näitame, et tulemusena saadud mudelid on konkurentsivõimelised käsitsi märgitud andmetel ja kaugjärelevalve käigus saadud andmetel treenitud mudelitega. Samuti ületavad mudelid NLG andmete suurendamise tehnikaid kasutades koolitatud mudeleid. Otsingupõhise lähenemisviisi laiendamine NLG meetodiga parandab tulemusi veelgi.', 'ca': "L'aparició de xarxes neurals a NLP va portar millors substancials en l'extracció supervisada de relacions. Però aconseguir una quantitat suficient de dades d'entrenament és un repte clau. En aquesta feina proposem un procés per a arrancar conjunts de dades d'entrenament que poden ser executats ràpidament per experts no del NLP. Aproveiem els motors de cerca a través de gràfics sinàctics (com Shlain et al. (2020)) que exponen una sintaxi amigable per exemple. Els fem servir per obtenir exemples positius buscant frases sinàcticament similars a exemples d'entrada d'usuari. Aplicam aquesta tècnica a les relacions de TACRED i DocRED i demostrem que els models resultants són competitius amb models entrenats en dades anotates manualment i en dades obtingudes de supervisió remota. Els models també superen els models entrenats utilitzant tècniques d'augment de dades de NLG. L'ampliació de l'enfocament basat en la recerca amb el mètode NLG millora encara més els resultats.", 'fi': 'Neuroverkkojen syntyminen NLP:ssä toi mukanaan merkittäviä parannuksia valvottuun suhteenpoistoon. Koulutustietojen riittävä määrä on kuitenkin edelleen keskeinen haaste. Tässä työssä ehdotamme bootstrapping-koulutusaineistojen prosessia, jonka muut kuin NLP-asiantuntijat voivat suorittaa nopeasti. Hyödynnämme hakukoneita syntaktisien graafien sijaan (kuten Shlain et al. (2020)), jotka paljastavat ystävällisen esimerkin syntaksin. Käytämme näitä saadaksemme positiivisia esimerkkejä etsimällä lauseita, jotka ovat syntaktisesti samanlaisia kuin käyttäjän syöttöesimerkit. Sovellamme tätä tekniikkaa TACREDin ja DocREDin välisiin suhteisiin ja osoitamme, että tuloksena saadut mallit ovat kilpailukykyisiä manuaalisesti merkityihin tietoihin ja etävalvonnasta saatuihin tietoihin koulutettujen mallien kanssa. Mallit myös suoriutuvat NLG-datan augmentaatiotekniikoilla koulutetuista malleista. Hakupohjaisen lähestymistavan laajentaminen NLG-menetelmällä parantaa tuloksia entisestään.', 'he': 'ההופעה של רשתות עצביות ב-NLP הביאה איתה שיפורים משמעותיים בהוצאה מערכת יחסים מבוקרת. עם זאת, להשיג כמות מספיקה של נתוני אימון נשאר אתגר מפתח. בעבודה הזו אנו מציעים תהליך לארגון קופסאות נתונים שיכולים להופיע מהר על ידי מומחים לא-NLP. אנו מנצלים מנועי חיפוש על גרפים סינטקטיים (כמו שאלן וכל. (2020)) שמחשפים סינטקס ידידותי על ידי דוגמא. אנו משתמשים בזה כדי להשיג דוגמאות חיוביות על ידי חיפוש אחר משפטים שדומים באופן סינטקטי לדוגמאות הכניסה של משתמש. אנו מכניסים את הטכניקה הזו למערכת יחסים מטאקרד ודוקרד ולהראות שהדוגמנים הנוצאים מתחרים עם דוגמנים מאומנים על נתונים שנמצאים באופן ידני ובנתונים שנוצאים מעקב מרחוק. הדוגמנים גם עולים על הדוגמנים מאומנים באמצעות טכניקות גידול נתונים NLG. הרחבת הגישה המבוססת על חיפוש עם שיטת NLG משפר את התוצאות.', 'sk': 'Prihod nevronskih omrežij v NLP je prinesel znatne izboljšave pri nadzorovanem ekstrakciji relacij. Kljub temu ostaja pridobitev zadostne količine podatkov o usposabljanju ključni izziv. V tem delu predlagamo postopek za bootstrapping naborov podatkov o usposabljanju, ki ga lahko hitro izvedejo strokovnjaki, ki niso NLP. Izkoriščamo iskalnike pred sintaktičnimi grafi (kot je Shlain et al. (2020)), ki razkrivajo prijazno sintakso po primerih. Uporabljamo jih za pridobivanje pozitivnih primerov z iskanjem stavkov, ki so sintaktično podobni uporabniškim vnosom primerov. To tehniko uporabljamo za relacije TACRED in DocRED ter dokazujemo, da so nastali modeli konkurenčni z modeli, usposobljenimi na ročno označenih podatkih in podatkih, pridobljenih z daljnim nadzorom. Modeli tudi presegajo modele, usposobljene z uporabo tehnik povečanja podatkov NLG. Razširitev pristopa, ki temelji na iskanju, z metodo NLG dodatno izboljšuje rezultate.', 'bo': 'NLP ནང་གི་དྲ་རྒྱ་གི་ཡར་རྒྱས་འགྲོ་བཞིན་ཡོད་པ་དང་མཐོང་སྐྱོང་བའི་འབྲེལ་བ་ཕྱིར་བས་ཀྱི་རྐྱེན་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་ཚད་ལྡན་གྱིས་གནད་དོན་དག་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ་རེད། In this work we propose a process for bootstrapping training datasets which can be performed quickly by non-NLP-experts. We use advantage of search engines over syntactic-graphs (such as Shlain et al. (2020)) which expose a friendly by-example syntax. ང་ཚོས་འདི་དག་ལ་འཚོལ་བཤེར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་དཔེར་བརྗོད་འདི་དག་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་དཔེར་བརྗོད འུ་ཅག་གིས་TACRED དང་DocRED ལས་འབྲེལ་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་སྤྱོད་སྤྱད་ནས་ཕན་ཐོགས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Model also outperform models trained using NLG data augmentation techniques. NLG ལམ་ལུགས་དང་འཚོལ་བཤེར་དང་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་འཚོལ་བཤེར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཕར་མཐུན་བཟོ་བ་རེད།', 'jv': 'Adventuro ndhek jewel-jewel sing nganggo NLP iki dadi kapan akeh bantuan luwih dumadhi kapan tanggal nggawe gerakan politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang barêng-barêng iki kita mulai perusahaan kanggo ngilangno sistem anyari dadi nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas nek NLP ora bisa pasang. Awakdhéwé éntukno karo pergambar engines nggambar sistem-graphs (Suara Sesilhan et al.) Awak dhéwé ngéwangi iki banget kanggo ngerasakno operasi ning acara mbukak gambar kelangan seneng barang sampek karo bisa nguasakno Awak dhéwé aplikasi teknik iki kanggo nglanggar barang tarjamahan karo DokRED lan wong kuwi model sing ditambah barang sampek karo model sing dipatensak dadi manut lan dadi sing berarti dadi manit Sayensi TONDO', 'ha': "An samun masu tsarin neural-tarayya cikin NLP da shi ya sami marubuci mai girma cikin surori na tsari. A lokacin da ake samu gwargwadon data na aikin aiki, yana da kimar musamman. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗa wani aikin da za'a farata tsarin masu shiryarwa da za'a iya tafiyar da haraka na-NLP-masu sani. Tuna amfani da mashine masu shawara kan sigarin-sami (kamar Shlane et al(2020)) wanda ke nuna wani masõyi na misali na sami. Kana amfani da waɗannan, dõmin ka sami misãlai masu basu'a, ko ka nemi gafukan ayuka da ke daidaita misãlai masu cikin shirin ayuka. Munã amfani da wannan tekinci zuwa masu haɗi daga TACRED da DocERD kuma Muke nuna cewa misãlai masu motsi da aka yi wa shirin da hannayen da aka sanar da data da aka sami daga tsari mai nĩsa. @ info: tooltip Extending the search-based approach with the NLG method further improves the results."}
{'en': 'Towards a Decomposable Metric for Explainable Evaluation of Text Generation from AMR', 'ar': 'نحو مقياس قابل للتحلل للتقييم القابل للتفسير لتوليد النص من AMR', 'fr': 'Vers une métrique décomposable pour une évaluation explicable de la génération de texte à partir de la RAM', 'pt': 'Rumo a uma métrica decomponível para avaliação explicável da geração de texto a partir de AMR', 'es': 'Hacia una métrica descomponible para la evaluación explicable de la generación de textos a partir de AMR', 'hi': 'AMR से पाठ पीढ़ी के समझाने योग्य मूल्यांकन के लिए एक Decomposable मीट्रिक की ओर', 'ru': 'На пути к разлагаемой метрике для объяснимой оценки генерации текста из АМР', 'ja': 'AMRからのテキスト生成の説明可能な評価のための分解可能なメトリックに向けて', 'zh': '迈向可分解指标,以AMR文本为可解之评', 'ga': 'I dTreo Méadrach In- Dhí-chomhdhlúite le haghaidh Meastóireacht Inmhínithe ar Ghiniúint Téacs ó AMR', 'ka': 'AMR- დან ტექსტის შექმნის განსაზღვრებელი განსაზღვრებელი მეტრიკის მიხედვით', 'hu': 'Az AMR-ből származó szöveggenerálás magyarázható értékeléséhez szükséges bontható metrika felé', 'el': 'Προς ένα αποσυντίθετο μετρικό για επεξήγητη αξιολόγηση της δημιουργίας κειμένου από την ΑΜR', 'it': 'Verso una metrica scomposibile per la valutazione spiegabile della generazione di testo da AMR', 'kk': 'AMR- ден мәтінді құру үшін түсініктірілмейтін метрикалық жасау', 'lt': 'Tam, kad būtų galima aiškiai įvertinti teksto gamybą iš AMR', 'mk': 'Towards a Decomposable Metric for Explainable Evaluation of Text Generation from AMR', 'ms': 'Ke arah Metrik yang boleh Diputuskan untuk Evaluasi Penjanaan Teks yang Boleh Dijelaskan dari AMR', 'mn': 'АМР-ын Текст төрөлхтний тодорхойлж чадахгүй метрик руу', 'ml': 'AMR-ല്\u200d നിന്നും പദാവലി ജനിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വിശദീകരിക്കാവുന്നതിനുള്ള മെറിക്ക് മുകളിലേക്കു്', 'mt': 'Lejn Metriku Dekompożibbli għall-Evalwazzjoni Spjegabbli tal-Ġenerazzjoni tat-Test mill-AMR', 'ro': 'Către o metrică descompusă pentru evaluarea explicabilă a generarii de text din AMR', 'no': 'Til ein dekomposable metrik for utforskar evaluering av tekstgenerering frå AMR', 'sr': 'Prema nepromišljivom metriku za objašnjivu ocjenu generacije teksta iz AMR-a', 'si': 'AMR වලින් පැහැදිලි විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් මෙට්\u200dරික් වලට', 'pl': 'W kierunku rozkładalnej metryki do wyjaśnionej oceny generowania tekstu z AMR', 'so': 'Towards a Decomposable Metric for Explaiable Evaluation of Text Generation from AMR', 'sv': 'Mot en nedbrytbar metrik för förklarad utvärdering av textgenerering från AMR', 'ta': 'AMR இலிருந்து உரை உருவாக்கத்திற்கு விளக்கக்கூடிய மெட்ரிக்கு மேல்', 'ur': 'AMR سے پیغام پیدا کرنے کے قابل تفصیل کے متریک کی طرف', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hướng tới một Metric cho Giải thích sự đánh giá văn bản từ AMR', 'bg': 'Към разглобяема метрика за обяснима оценка на генерирането на текст от AMR', 'hr': 'prema nepromišljivom metriku za objašnjavajuću ocjenu generacije teksta iz AMR-a', 'nl': 'Naar een decomposeerbare metrica voor uitlegbare evaluatie van tekstgeneratie vanuit AMR', 'da': 'På vej mod en nedbrydelig metrik til forklarelig vurdering af tekstgenerering fra AMR', 'id': 'Menuju Metrik yang Dapat Dihancurkan untuk Evaluasi Penjanaan Teks Dari AMR', 'ko': 'AMR 텍스트에서 생성된 해석 가능 평가의 분해 가능 메트릭', 'fa': 'به سمت متریک ناکامل برای ارزیابی قابل توضیح نسل متن از AMR', 'sw': 'Kuelekea mbinu ya Kueleweka Kuelezea Uzalishaji wa Matambo kutoka AMR', 'de': 'Auf dem Weg zu einer zerlegbaren Metrik zur erklärbaren Auswertung der Textgenerierung aus AMR', 'af': "Gaan na 'n Onsamelende Metrik vir Verduidelike Evaluering van Teks Generasie van AMR", 'hy': 'Towards a Decomposable Metric for Explainable Evaluation of Text Generation from AMR', 'tr': "AMR'den Aňlap Metir Dönüşeniň Taýýarlanabilir Taýýarlama üçin", 'bn': 'AMR থেকে টেক্সট জেনারেশনের ব্যাখ্যা ব্যাখ্যা করার জন্য একটি ডিমোপসেবল মেট্রিক উঠেছে', 'bs': 'Prema nepromišljivom metriku za objašnjivu ocjenu generacije teksta iz AMR-a', 'sq': 'Për një Metrikë të Dëkompozueshme për vlerësimin e shpjegueshëm të gjenerimit të tekstit nga AMR', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'az': "AMR'd톛n M톛tn M톛xluqat캼n캼n A칞캼labilir Q톛rcl톛m톛si 칲칞칲n A칞캼labilir Metric t톛r톛find톛", 'fi': 'Kohti hajoavaa mittaria AMR:n tekstintuotannon selittävään arviointiin', 'cs': 'K rozložitelné metrice pro vysvětlitelné hodnocení generace textu z AMR', 'et': 'Laguneva mõõdiku suunas, et selgitada teksti genereerimist AMR-ist', 'ca': 'Towards a Decomposable Metric for Explainable Evaluation of Text Generation from AMR', 'jv': 'ProgressBar', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'K razgradljivi metriki za razložljivo vrednotenje ustvarjanja besedila iz AMR', 'he': 'לכיוון מטריקה בלתי מורכבת להערכה מוסברת של יצירת טקסט מ AMR', 'bo': 'Towards a Decomposable Metric for Explainable Evaluation of Text Generation from AMR'}
{'en': 'Systems that generate natural language text from abstract meaning representations such as AMR are typically evaluated using automatic surface matching metrics that compare the generated texts to reference texts from which the input meaning representations were constructed. We show that besides well-known issues from which such metrics suffer, an additional problem arises when applying these metrics for AMR-to-text evaluation, since an abstract meaning representation allows for numerous surface realizations. In this work we aim to alleviate these issues by proposing _, a decomposable metric that builds on two pillars. The first is the principle of meaning preservation   : it measures to what extent a given AMR can be reconstructed from the generated sentence using SOTA AMR parsers and applying (fine-grained) AMR evaluation metrics to measure the distance between the original and the reconstructed AMR. The second pillar builds on a principle of (grammatical) form    that measures the linguistic quality of the generated text, which we implement using SOTA language models. In two extensive pilot studies we show that fulfillment of both principles offers benefits for AMR-to-text evaluation, including explainability of scores. Since _ does not necessarily rely on gold AMRs, it may extend to other text generation tasks.\\mathcal{M}\\mathcal{F}_\\beta, a decomposable metric that builds on two pillars. The first is the principle of meaning preservation \\mathcal{M}\n        : it measures to what extent a given AMR can be reconstructed from the generated sentence using SOTA AMR parsers and applying (fine-grained) AMR evaluation metrics to measure the distance between the original and the reconstructed AMR. The second pillar builds on a principle of (grammatical) form \\mathcal{F}\n         that measures the linguistic quality of the generated text, which we implement using SOTA language models. In two extensive pilot studies we show that fulfillment of both principles offers benefits for AMR-to-text evaluation, including explainability of scores. Since \\mathcal{M}\\mathcal{F}_\\beta does not necessarily rely on gold AMRs, it may extend to other text generation tasks.', 'fr': "Les systèmes qui génèrent un texte en langage naturel à partir de représentations de signification abstraites telles que la RAM sont généralement évalués à l'aide de mesures de correspondance de surface automatique qui comparent les textes générés aux textes de référence à partir desquels les représentations de signification d'entrée ont été construites. Nous montrons qu'en plus des problèmes bien connus dont souffrent ces métriques, un problème supplémentaire se pose lors de l'application de ces métriques pour l'évaluation AMR au texte, étant donné qu'une représentation de signification abstraite permet de nombreuses réalisations de surface. Dans ce travail, nous visons à résoudre ces problèmes en proposant _β, une métrique décomposable qui repose sur deux piliers. Le premier est le principe de préservation de la signification\xa0: il mesure dans quelle mesure une RAM donnée peut être reconstruite à partir de la phrase générée à l'aide d'analyseurs AMR SOTA et en appliquant des métriques d'évaluation AMR (fines) pour mesurer la distance entre l'AMR original et l'AMR reconstruit. Le deuxième pilier repose sur un principe de forme (grammaticale) qui mesure la qualité linguistique du texte généré, que nous mettons en œuvre à l'aide des modèles linguistiques SOTA. Dans deux études pilotes approfondies, nous montrons que le respect des deux principes offre des avantages pour l'évaluation AMR en texte, y compris l'explicabilité des scores. Puisque _β ne repose pas nécessairement sur les AMR Gold, il peut s'étendre à d'autres tâches de génération de texte.", 'ar': 'عادةً ما يتم تقييم الأنظمة التي تنشئ نصًا بلغة طبيعية من تمثيلات المعنى المجردة مثل AMR باستخدام مقاييس مطابقة السطح التلقائية التي تقارن النصوص المُنشأة بالنصوص المرجعية التي تم إنشاء تمثيلات المعنى منها. نوضح أنه بالإضافة إلى المشكلات المعروفة التي تعاني منها هذه المقاييس ، تظهر مشكلة إضافية عند تطبيق هذه المقاييس لتقييم AMR إلى نص ، حيث يسمح تمثيل المعنى المجرد بالعديد من عمليات الإدراك السطحي. نهدف في هذا العمل إلى التخفيف من حدة هذه المشكلات من خلال اقتراح ℳℱ_β ، وهو مقياس قابل للتحلل يقوم على ركيزتين. الأول هو مبدأ الحفاظ على المعنى ℳ: فهو يقيس إلى أي مدى يمكن إعادة بناء AMR معين من الجملة التي تم إنشاؤها باستخدام محللات SOTA AMR وتطبيق مقاييس تقييم AMR (الدقيقة) لقياس المسافة بين AMR الأصلي والمعاد بناؤه. . يرتكز العمود الثاني على مبدأ الشكل (النحوي) الذي يقيس الجودة اللغوية للنص الناتج ، والذي نطبقه باستخدام نماذج لغة SOTA. في دراستين تجريبيتين مكثفتين ، أظهرنا أن تحقيق كلا المبدأين يوفر فوائد لتقييم AMR-to-text ، بما في ذلك إمكانية شرح الدرجات. نظرًا لأن ℳℱ_β لا يعتمد بالضرورة على AMRs الذهبية ، فقد يمتد إلى مهام إنشاء النص الأخرى.', 'pt': 'Os sistemas que geram texto em linguagem natural a partir de representações abstratas de significado, como AMR, são normalmente avaliados usando métricas de correspondência automática de superfície que comparam os textos gerados a textos de referência a partir dos quais as representações de significado de entrada foram construídas. Mostramos que, além de problemas conhecidos de que tais métricas sofrem, surge um problema adicional ao aplicar essas métricas para avaliação AMR-to-text, uma vez que uma representação abstrata de significado permite inúmeras realizações de superfície. Neste trabalho, pretendemos aliviar esses problemas propondo ℳℱ_β, uma métrica decomponível que se baseia em dois pilares. O primeiro é o princípio de preservação de significado ℳ : mede até que ponto um dado AMR pode ser reconstruído a partir da sentença gerada usando analisadores SOTA AMR e aplicando métricas de avaliação AMR (de granulação fina) para medir a distância entre o AMR original e o reconstruído . O segundo pilar se baseia em um princípio de forma (gramatical) ℱ que mede a qualidade linguística do texto gerado, que implementamos usando modelos de linguagem SOTA. Em dois extensos estudos-piloto, mostramos que o cumprimento de ambos os princípios oferece benefícios para a avaliação AMR-to-text, incluindo a explicabilidade das pontuações. Como ℳℱ_β não depende necessariamente de AMRs de ouro, ele pode se estender a outras tarefas de geração de texto.', 'es': 'Los sistemas que generan texto en lenguaje natural a partir de representaciones de significado abstracto, como AMR, se evalúan normalmente mediante métricas de coincidencia de superficie automática que comparan los textos generados con textos de referencia a partir de los cuales se construyeron las representaciones de significado de entrada Demostramos que, además de los problemas bien conocidos que sufren tales métricas, surge un problema adicional al aplicar estas métricas para la evaluación de AMR a texto, ya que una representación abstracta del significado permite numerosas realizaciones de la superficie. En este trabajo pretendemos aliviar estos problemas proponiendo _β, una métrica descomponible que se basa en dos pilares. El primero es el principio de preservación del significado: mide hasta qué punto una RAM determinada se puede reconstruir a partir de la oración generada utilizando analizadores de AMR SOTA y aplicando métricas de evaluación de AMR (detalladas) para medir la distancia entre la RAM original y la reconstruida. El segundo pilar se basa en un principio de forma (gramatical) que mide la calidad lingüística del texto generado, que implementamos utilizando modelos de lenguaje SOTA. En dos extensos estudios piloto, demostramos que el cumplimiento de ambos principios ofrece beneficios para la evaluación de AMR a texto, incluida la explicabilidad de los puntajes. Dado que _β no depende necesariamente de AMR dorados, puede extenderse a otras tareas de generación de texto.', 'ja': 'ＡＭＲなどの抽象意味表現から自然言語テキストを生成するシステムは、典型的には、生成されたテキストを入力意味表現が構築された参照テキストと比較する自動サーフェスマッチングメトリクスを使用して評価される。 抽象的な意味表現が多くの表面実現を可能にするため、そのような指標が被る既知の問題に加えて、AMRからテキストへの評価にこれらの指標を適用する際に追加の問題が発生することを示しています。 この研究では、これらの問題を緩和することを目指しています。これは、2つの柱に基づいて構築された分解可能なメトリックである、;_βを提案することで、これらの問題を緩和することを目指しています。 1つ目は、意味保存の原理です。Sota AMRパーサーを使用して生成された文章から、元のAMRと再構築されたAMRとの間の距離を測定するためにAMR評価メトリックを適用して、与えられたAMRをどの程度再構築できるかを測定します。 第二の柱は、生成されたテキストの言語的質を測定する（文法的）形式の原理に基づいており、ソタ言語モデルを使用して実装しています。 2つの広範なパイロット研究では、両方の原則を満たすことが、スコアの説明可能性を含むAMRからテキストへの評価に利点をもたらすことを示しています。 必ずしも金のＡＭＲに依存しないため、他のテキスト生成タスクにも及ぶ可能性がある。', 'hi': 'एएमआर जैसे अमूर्त अर्थ अभ्यावेदन से प्राकृतिक भाषा पाठ उत्पन्न करने वाली प्रणालियों का मूल्यांकन आमतौर पर स्वचालित सतह मिलान मैट्रिक्स का उपयोग करके किया जाता है जो उत्पन्न ग्रंथों की तुलना संदर्भ ग्रंथों से करते हैं, जिनसे इनपुट अर्थ प्रतिनिधित्व का निर्माण किया गया था। हम दिखाते हैं कि अच्छी तरह से ज्ञात मुद्दों के अलावा, जिनसे इस तरह के मैट्रिक्स पीड़ित हैं, एएमआर-टू-टेक्स्ट मूल्यांकन के लिए इन मैट्रिक्स को लागू करते समय एक अतिरिक्त समस्या उत्पन्न होती है, क्योंकि एक अमूर्त अर्थ प्रतिनिधित्व कई सतह प्राप्ति के लिए अनुमति देता है। इस काम में हम MF_β का प्रस्ताव करके इन मुद्दों को कम करने का लक्ष्य रखते हैं, एक विघटित मीट्रिक जो दो स्तंभों पर बनाता है। पहला अर्थ संरक्षण एम का सिद्धांत है: यह मापता है कि किसी दिए गए एएमआर को किस हद तक एसओटीए एएमआर पार्सर का उपयोग करके उत्पन्न वाक्य से पुनर्निर्मित किया जा सकता है और मूल और पुनर्निर्मित एएमआर के बीच की दूरी को मापने के लिए (ठीक दानेदार) एएमआर मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक लागू किया जा सकता है। दूसरा स्तंभ (व्याकरणिक) फॉर्म एफ के सिद्धांत पर बनाता है जो उत्पन्न पाठ की भाषाई गुणवत्ता को मापता है, जिसे हम सोटा भाषा मॉडल का उपयोग करके लागू करते हैं। दो व्यापक पायलट अध्ययनों में हम दिखाते हैं कि दोनों सिद्धांतों की पूर्ति एएमआर-टू-टेक्स्ट मूल्यांकन के लिए लाभ प्रदान करती है, जिसमें स्कोर की व्याख्या भी शामिल है। चूंकि MF_β आवश्यक रूप से सोने के एएमआर पर भरोसा नहीं करता है, इसलिए यह अन्य पाठ पीढ़ी के कार्यों तक विस्तारित हो सकता है।', 'zh': '抽象之义(如 AMR)生自然语言文本之统,常以自外配度量为质,其质直将生成之本与构输义者,引文本校之。 臣等明指标所遭众所知之外,指标应用于AMR,文本评估,别有一端,盖抽象之义,许以阳成也。 此则MF_β以纾之,是一在两柱之上可解指标。 一曰义存M之道:其用SOTA AMR解析器而用(细粒度)AMR评指标以度始重AMR之间,可于多大程度上从生句中重建给定之AMR。 二柱立于(语法)文F之上,量生文本之言,SOTA言而成之。 博试二者,明AMR文本之评,分数之可解释性也。 MF_β不必依于黄金AMR,故其广于他文也。', 'ru': 'Системы, которые генерируют текст на естественном языке из абстрактных представлений значений, таких как AMR, обычно оцениваются с использованием автоматических метрик сопоставления поверхностей, которые сравнивают сгенерированные тексты со ссылочными текстами, из которых были построены входные представления значений. Мы показываем, что помимо хорошо известных проблем, от которых страдают такие метрики, возникает дополнительная проблема при применении этих метрик для оценки от АМР к тексту, поскольку абстрактное представление смысла допускает многочисленные поверхностные реализации. В этой работе мы стремимся облегчить эти проблемы, предлагая понижаемую метрику, которая строится на двух столпах. Первый - это принцип сохранения смысла: он измеряет, в какой степени данный AMR может быть реконструирован из сгенерированного предложения с помощью парсеров SOTA AMR и применения (мелкозернистых) метрик оценки AMR для измерения расстояния между исходным и реконструированным AMR. Второй столп построен на принципе (грамматической) формы, которая измеряет лингвистическое качество сгенерированного текста, который мы реализуем с помощью языковых моделей SOTA. В двух обширных пилотных исследованиях мы показали, что выполнение обоих принципов обеспечивает преимущества для оценки АМР в соответствии с текстом, включая объяснимость баллов. В связи с тем, что в основе алгоритма не обязательно лежат золотые AMR, он может распространяться и на другие задачи генерации текста.', 'ga': 'Go hiondúil déantar meastóireacht ar chórais a ghineann téacs teanga nádúrtha ó léiriúcháin brí teibí ar nós AMR trí úsáid a bhaint as méadracht uathmheaitseála dromchla a dhéanann comparáid idir na téacsanna ginte agus téacsanna tagartha ónar tógadh na huiríll brí ionchuir. Léirímid, sa bhreis ar shaincheisteanna aitheanta óna bhfuil an mhéadracht sin ag fulaingt, go n-eascraíonn fadhb bhreise agus na méadrachtaí seo á gcur i bhfeidhm le haghaidh meastóireachta AMR-go-téacs, toisc go gceadaíonn léiriú brí teibí go leor réaduithe dromchla a dhéanamh. San obair seo tá sé mar aidhm againn na saincheisteanna seo a mhaolú trí ℳℱ_β a mholadh, méadrach in-dhianscaoilte a thógann ar dhá cholún. Is é an chéad cheann prionsabal an chaomhnaithe brí ℳ : tomhaiseann sé a mhéid is féidir AMR ar leith a atógáil ón abairt a ghintear trí úsáid a bhaint as parsálaithe AMR SOTA agus ag baint úsáide as méadracht mheastóireachta AMR (mín-ghráin) chun an fad idir an AMB bunaidh agus an AMB athdhéanta a thomhas. . Tógann an dara colún ar phrionsabal na foirme (gramadaí) ℱ a thomhaiseann cáilíocht theangeolaíoch an téacs ginte, a chuirimid i bhfeidhm ag baint úsáide as samhlacha teanga SOTA. In dhá staidéar phíolótacha fhairsing léirímid go dtugann comhlíonadh an dá phrionsabal buntáistí do mheastóireacht AMR-go-téacs, lena n-áirítear míniúchán na scóir. Ós rud é nach gá go mbraitheann ℳℱ_β ar AMRanna óir, d’fhéadfadh go gcuimseodh sé tascanna giniúna téacs eile.', 'hu': 'Azokat a rendszereket, amelyek absztrakt jelentési reprezentációkból, például az AMR-ből természetes nyelvű szöveget generálnak, általában automatikus felületi megfelelő mutatók segítségével értékelik, amelyek összehasonlítják a generált szövegeket azokkal a referenciaszövegekkel, amelyekből a bemeneti jelentési reprezentációk készültek. Megmutatjuk, hogy a jól ismert problémák mellett, amelyektől ilyen mérőszámok szenvednek, további probléma merül fel az AMR-szöveg értékeléshez való alkalmazásakor, mivel az absztrakt jelentésreformáció számos felületi realizációt tesz lehetővé. Ebben a munkában célunk, hogy enyhítsük ezeket a problémákat azáltal, hogy javaslatot teszünk egy bontható mutatóra, amely két pillérre épül. Az első a jelentés megőrzésének elve: méri, hogy egy adott AMR milyen mértékben rekonstruálható az előállított mondatból SOTA AMR elemzők segítségével, és (finomszemű) AMR értékelési mutatók alkalmazásával méri az eredeti és a rekonstruált AMR közötti távolság mérésére. A második pillér a (nyelvtani) forma elvére épül, amely méri a létrehozott szöveg nyelvi minőségét, amelyet SOTA nyelvi modellek segítségével valósítunk meg. Két átfogó kísérleti tanulmányban azt mutatjuk, hogy mindkét elv betartása előnyöket kínál az AMR-szöveges értékelés számára, beleértve a pontszámok magyarázhatóságát is. Mivel a _ nem feltétlenül támaszkodik az arany AMR-ekre, kiterjedhet más szöveggenerálási feladatokra is.', 'ka': 'Name ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ მცნობილი პრობლემების დამატებით, რომლებიც ასეთი მეტრიკების განმავლობაში, დამატებული პრობლემები იქნება, როდესაც ამ მეტრიკების გამოყენება AMR-დან ტექსტის განსაზღვ ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ მივიღეთ ამ პრობლემების გახსნა  , რომელსაც ორი კოლემებზე დავყენება  , გახსენებელი მეტრიკა. პირველი არის სანიშნო დახმარებას პრინციპი : ის მოზემის რამდენი განსაზღვრებული AMR შესაძლებელია განსაზღვრებული სიმბოლოდან გამოყენებული SOTA AMR პასუტერების გამოყენებით და გამოყენებული AMR განსაზღვრების მეტრიკის გამოყენება, რომ განტოლება ორ მეორე კოლემატიკური ფორმატიკის პრინციპზე შექმნა, რომელიც შექმნილი ტექსტის ლენგურისტიკური კაalitეტის გაზომილება, რომელიც ჩვენ SOTA ენის მოდელების გამოყენებით გამოყენებთ. ორი განსაზღვრებული ოთლოტის სწავლებში ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ორივე პრინციპების დასრულებაში გამოიყენება AMR-დან ტექსტის განსაზღვრებისთვის გამოიყენება, включая წერ რადგან   არ უნდა დარწმუნელად დარწმუნდება დალარული AMRs-ზე, ეს შეიძლება დარწმუნდება სხვა ტექსტის წარმოიქმნის საქმედებისთვის.', 'el': 'Τα συστήματα που παράγουν κείμενο φυσικής γλώσσας από αφηρημένες αναπαραστάσεις εννοιών όπως η ΑΜR αξιολογούνται συνήθως χρησιμοποιώντας αυτόματες μετρήσεις αντιστοίχισης επιφάνειας που συγκρίνουν τα παραγόμενα κείμενα με κείμενα αναφοράς από τα οποία κατασκευάστηκαν οι αναπαραστάσεις εννοιών εισόδου. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι εκτός από τα γνωστά ζητήματα από τα οποία υποφέρουν τέτοιες μετρήσεις, δημιουργείται ένα πρόσθετο πρόβλημα κατά την εφαρμογή αυτών των μετρήσεων για την αξιολόγηση του κειμένου, καθώς μια αφηρημένη αναπαράσταση εννοιών επιτρέπει πολλές επιφανειακές υλοποιήσεις. Στην παρούσα εργασία στοχεύουμε στην ανακούφιση αυτών των ζητημάτων προτείνοντας μια αποσυναρμολογήσιμη μέτρηση που βασίζεται σε δύο πυλώνες. Η πρώτη είναι η αρχή της διατήρησης της έννοιας: μετρά σε ποιο βαθμό ένα δεδομένο AMR μπορεί να ανακατασκευαστεί από την παραγόμενη πρόταση χρησιμοποιώντας αναλυτές SOTA AMR και εφαρμόζοντας (λεπτόκοκκες) μετρήσεις αξιολόγησης AMR για τη μέτρηση της απόστασης μεταξύ του αρχικού και του ανακατασκευασμένου AMR. Ο δεύτερος πυλώνας βασίζεται σε μια αρχή της (γραμματικής) μορφής που μετρά την γλωσσική ποιότητα του παραγόμενου κειμένου, την οποία εφαρμόζουμε χρησιμοποιώντας γλωσσικά μοντέλα SOTA. Σε δύο εκτεταμένες πιλοτικές μελέτες καταδεικνύουμε ότι η εκπλήρωση και των δύο αρχών προσφέρει οφέλη για την αξιολόγηση μέσω κειμένου, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της επεξήγησης των βαθμολογιών. Δεδομένου ότι το _ δεν βασίζεται απαραίτητα σε χρυσές ΑΜR, μπορεί να επεκταθεί και σε άλλες εργασίες δημιουργίας κειμένου.', 'it': "I sistemi che generano testo in linguaggio naturale da rappresentazioni astratte di significato come AMR sono tipicamente valutati utilizzando metriche automatiche di corrispondenza delle superfici che confrontano i testi generati con testi di riferimento da cui sono state costruite le rappresentazioni di significato di input. Mostriamo che oltre a problemi ben noti da cui tali metriche soffrono, si pone un ulteriore problema quando si applicano queste metriche per la valutazione AMR-to-text, poiché una rappresentazione astratta del significato consente numerose realizzazioni superficiali. In questo lavoro puntiamo ad alleviare questi problemi proponendo _, una metrica scomposibile che si basa su due pilastri. Il primo è il principio di conservazione del significato: misura in che misura un dato AMR può essere ricostruito dalla frase generata utilizzando parser AMR SOTA e applicando metriche di valutazione AMR (a grana fine) per misurare la distanza tra l'AMR originale e quello ricostruito. Il secondo pilastro si basa su un principio di forma (grammaticale) che misura la qualità linguistica del testo generato, che implementiamo utilizzando modelli linguistici SOTA. In due studi pilota approfonditi abbiamo dimostrato che il rispetto di entrambi i principi offre benefici per la valutazione AMR-to-text, compresa l'spiegabilità dei punteggi. Poiché _ non si basa necessariamente su AMR oro, può estendersi ad altre attività di generazione di testo.", 'lt': 'Systems that generate natural language text from abstract meaning representations such as AMR are typically evaluated using automatic surface matching metrics that compare the generated texts to reference texts from which the input meaning representations were constructed.  Mes rodome, kad be gerai žinomų klausimų, dėl kurių kenčia tokie rodikliai, kyla papildoma problema taikant šiuos rodiklius AMR vertinimui tekstui, nes abstraktus reikšmė leidžia atlikti daugybę paviršiaus realizacijų. Šiame darbe siekiame sušvelninti šiuos klausimus pasiūlydami  , atsiskaidžiusią metriją, kuri grindžiama dviem ramsčiais. Pirmasis yra reikšmės išsaugojimo principas : jame nustatoma, kiek tam tikrą AMR galima atstatyti iš sukaupto sakinio naudojant SOTA AMR analizatorius ir taikant (smulkiai grūdintus) AMR vertinimo metrijas, kad būtų matuojamas atstumas tarp originalo ir atstatyto AMR. Antrasis ramstis grindžiamas (gramatinės) formos principu, kuris matuoja sukurto teksto kalbinę kokybę, kurią įgyvendiname naudojant SOTA kalbos modelius. Dviejuose išsamiuose bandomuosiuose tyrimuose parodoma, kad abiejų principų laikymasis suteikia naudos vertinimui iš vieno į kitą, įskaitant rezultatų paaiškinimą. Kadangi   nebūtinai remiasi auksiniais AMR, jis gali apimti kitas tekstų kūrimo užduotis.', 'kk': 'Абстракты мәліметтерден табиғи тілді жасайтын жүйелер, мысалы AMR деген мәліметтерден, жасалған мәтіндерді келтірілген мәтіндерге сәйкес келетін метрикалық көмегімен, автоматты түрде сәйкес келетін мә Біз бұл метрикалық мәселелерден басқа білетін мәселелерден басқа, AMR- мен мәтінді бағалау үшін бұл метрикалық мәселелерді қолдану үшін қосымша мәселе болады, себебі абстрактық мәлімет мәсе Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз осы мәселелерді , екі бағандарда құрылатын метрикалық мәселелерді көшірмелеу үшін мақсаттамыз. Біріншісі - мәліметті сақтау принципі : бұл келтірілген AMR мәліметті SOTA AMR талдаушыларынан қайта құрылады және (жиілікті) AMR бағалау метрикаларының бастапқы және қайта құрылған AMR арасындағы қашықтығын өлшеу үшін өлшемі ү Екінші бағандар (грамматикалық) пішімінің принципіне құрылады. Бұл құрылған мәтіннің лингвистикалық сапасын өлшейтін, біз SOTA тіл үлгілерімен істейтін. Екі кеңейтілген эксперименттік зерттеулерде екі принципінің орындалуы AMR- мен мәтіннің бағалауында, мәтіндердің түсініктемесін қоса, мәтіндерді түсініктемесін көрсетеді. Бірақ   алтын AMR- ге тәуелді емес, ол басқа мәтін құру тапсырмаларына келтіре алады.', 'ms': 'Systems that generate natural language text from abstract meaning representations such as AMR are typically evaluated using automatic surface matching metrics that compare the generated texts to reference texts from which the input meaning representations were constructed.  Kami menunjukkan bahawa selain isu yang diketahui yang metrik tersebut menderita, masalah tambahan muncul apabila melaksanakan metrik ini untuk penilaian AMR-ke-teks, kerana persembahan makna abstrak membolehkan banyak penemuan permukaan. Dalam kerja ini kami bertujuan untuk mengurangi isu-isu ini dengan melamar , metrik yang boleh dihapus yang membina pada dua pilar. Pertama adalah prinsip penjagaan makna : ia mengukur ke mana mana AMR yang diberikan boleh dibangun semula dari kalimat yang dijana menggunakan penghurai SOTA AMR dan melaksanakan metrik penilaian AMR (berwarna gandum) untuk mengukur jarak antara AMR yang asal dan yang dibina semula. Pilar kedua dibangun pada prinsip bentuk (grammatik) yang mengukur kualiti bahasa teks yang dijana, yang kami laksanakan menggunakan model bahasa SOTA. In two extensive pilot studies we show that fulfillment of both principles offers benefits for AMR-to-text evaluation, including explainability of scores.  Oleh kerana  tidak perlu bergantung pada AMR emas, ia boleh meneruskan ke tugas generasi teks lain.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ പദാവലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രതിനിധികളില്\u200d നിന്നും സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും എംആര്\u200d പോലുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികളില്\u200d നിന്നും സാധാരണ വിലാ ഇത്തരം മെട്രിക്കുകള്\u200d കഷ്ടപ്പെടുന്ന പ്രശ്നങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാകുന്നു. AMR-ലേക്ക് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുമ്പോള്\u200d ഈ മ ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെ ലളിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. രണ്ട് സ്തംഭങ്ങളില്\u200d പണിയുന്ന ഒരു മെട്രിക്ക് മുഴ ആദ്യത്തെ അർഥം സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ നിയമമാണ്: AMR കൊടുത്ത വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പുനരുമാറ്റിയ വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും സോട്ടാ AMR പാര്\u200dസറുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനും പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നത രണ്ടാമത്തെ സ്തൂണ്\u200d (ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d) രൂപത്തിന്\u200dറെ (ഗ്രാമാന്റിക്കല്\u200d) രൂപം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. അത് സൃഷ്ടിച്ച പദാവലിയുടെ ഭാഷ ഗുണവ രണ്ടു വിശാലമായ പൈലറ്റ് പഠനങ്ങളില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു രണ്ട് നിയമങ്ങളുടെ പൂര്\u200dത്തീകരണം AMR-ലേക്ക് ട സ്വര്\u200dണത്തിന്\u200dറെ എംഎംആര്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ മേല്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കാത്തതിനാല്\u200d, അത് മറ്റൊരു ടെക്സ്റ്റ് തലമുറതലമുറയിലേക്ക് വ', 'mk': 'Системите кои генерираат природен јазик текст од апстрактни претставувања на значење како што е АМР се обично проценуваат користејќи автоматски метрики кои се совпаѓаат со површината кои ги споредуваат генерираните тексти со референтни тексти од кои беа изградени претставувања со значење на внесот Покрај познатите прашања од кои страдаат ваквите метрики, се појавува дополнителен проблем при апликацијата на овие метрики за проценка од АМР до текст, со оглед на тоа што апстрактна претстава на значењето овозможува бројни површини. Во оваа работа ние имаме за цел да ги олесниме овие прашања со предложување , распоредлива метрика која се гради на два столбови. Првиот е принципот на значењето зачувување  : тој мери во каков степен може да се реконструира одредена АМР од генерираната реченица користејќи SOTA АМР анализатори и аплицирајќи (фино-населени) метрики за проценка на АМР за мерење на растојанието помеѓу оригиналот и реконструираниот Вториот столб се базира на принцип на (граматична) форма, кој го мери јазичниот квалитет на генерираниот текст, кој го имплементираме користејќи модели на јазик SOTA. Во две експлозивни пилотски студии покажуваме дека исполнувањето на двата принципи нуди бенефиции за проценка од АМР до текст, вклучувајќи ја и објаснувањето на резултатите. Бидејќи  не мора да се потпира на златни АМР, може да се шири до други задачи за генерација на текст.', 'mt': "Sistemi li jiġġeneraw test lingwistiku naturali minn rappreżentazzjonijiet tat-tifsira astratta bħall-AMR huma tipikament evalwati bl-użu ta’ metriċi awtomatiċi li jaqblu mal-wiċċ li jqabblu t-testi ġġenerati ma’ testi ta’ referenza li minnhom inbnew ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet tat-tifsira input. Aħna nuru li minbarra kwistjonijiet magħrufa sew li jsofru minn dawn il-metriċi, tinħoloq problema addizzjonali meta jiġu applikati dawn il-metriċi għall-evalwazzjoni AMR-test, peress li rappreżentazzjoni tat-tifsira astratta tippermetti diversi realizzazzjonijiet tal-wiċċ. F'din il-ħidma għandna l-għan li nnaqqsu dawn il-kwistjonijiet billi nipproponu  , metrika dekompożibbli li tibni fuq żewġ pilastri. L-ewwel huwa l-prinċipju ta’ preżervazzjoni tat-tifsira  : huwa jkejjel sa liema punt AMR partikolari jista’ jiġi rikostrutt mis-sentenza ġġenerata bl-użu ta’ SOTA AMR parsers u l-applikazzjoni ta’ metriċi ta’ evalwazzjoni (imqabbda fin) AMR biex titkejjel id-distanza bejn l-AMR oriġinali u dak rikostrutt. It-tieni pilastru jibni fuq prinċipju tal-form a (grammatika) li jkejjel il-kwalità lingwistika tat-test iġġenerat, li nimplimentaw bl-użu ta’ mudelli lingwistiċi tas-SOTA. In two extensive pilot studies we show that fulfillment of both principles offers benefits for AMR-to-text evaluation, including explainability of scores.  Billi  mhux neċessarjament jiddependi fuq AMRs tad-deheb, jista’ jestendi għal kompiti oħra ta’ ġenerazzjoni tat-test.", 'mn': 'АМР шиг байгалийн хэлний текст бий болгодог системүүд нь автоматически гадаргуу холбогдох метрикийг ашиглаж, бий болгосон текстүүдийг харьцуулж, харьцуулахын утгыг нь бий болгосон утгыг харьцуулж байна. Бид ийм метриктикүүдийн алдартай асуудлуудыг харуулж байна. АМР-т текст шалгалтын тулд нэмэлт асуудлууд үүсгэдэг. Яагаад гэвэл abstract утгын үзүүлэлт нь олон гадаргуудын бодит байдлыг ашиглах боломжтой болдог. Энэ ажлын тулд бид эдгээр асуудлыг багасгах зорилготой , хоёр төмөр дээр бий болгон хуваагдмал метрик гэдгийг сануулж байна. Эхлээд хэлбэрээр хадгалах утгатай санааны үндэслэл нь: энэ нь анхны болон дахин бүтээгдэхүүний зай хоорондоо хэмжээний тулд зориулсан өгүүлбэрээс дахин бүтээж болох юм. Хоёр дахь баган нь (грамматик) хэлбэрийн үндэслэл дээр зохион байгуулдаг. Энэ нь бидний SOTA хэл загварын аргаар хийсэн хэлний хэлний чанарын хэмжээг хэмжээдэг. Хоёр өргөн туршилтын судалгаанд бид хоёр үндсэн дүрслэл нь AMR-ээс текст дүрслэлд ашигтай гэдгийг харуулж байна. Яагаад гэвэл   алт AMR дээр байхгүй учраас энэ нь бусад текст үеийн даалгаврыг нэмэгдүүлж болох юм.', 'no': 'Systemar som lagar naturspråket frå abstrakt meningsrepresentasjonar som AMR er vanlegvis evaluert med automatisk overflate som passar med metrikar som samanliknar dei genererte tekstane til referanstekstar frå kva inndatasigneringsrepresentasjonane er konstruerte. Vi viser at i staden for godt kjent problemar som slike metrikar køyrer frå, oppstår eit ekstra problem ved å bruka disse metrikane for AMR- til- tekstevaluering, sidan eit abstrakt mening tillater mange overflatene. I denne arbeiden må vi løyse desse problemene ved å foreslå  , ein dekomponerbar metrik som bygger på to pilar. Den første er prinsippet for konservasjon : den målar kor mykje ein gitt AMR kan gjenopprettast frå den genererte setninga ved hjelp av SOTA AMR-tillesarar og brukar (fine-grained) AMR-evalueringsmetrikar for å måle avstanden mellom originalen og den gjenopprette AMR. Den andre pilaren bygger på ein prinsipp av (grammatisk) form som måler den lingviske kvaliteten til den genererte teksten, som vi implementerer med SOTA språk-modeller. I to utvida pilotstudier viser vi at fullføring av begge prinsipper tilbyr fordel for AMR- til- tekstevaluering, inkludert forklarability av poeng. Sidan   ikkje nødvendigvis rely på gull AMR, kan det utvida til andre tekstoppgåver.', 'pl': 'Systemy generujące tekst języka naturalnego z abstrakcyjnych reprezentacji znaczenia, takich jak AMR, są zazwyczaj oceniane przy użyciu automatycznych wskaźników dopasowywania powierzchni, które porównują wygenerowane teksty z tekstami referencyjnymi, z których zbudowano reprezentacje znaczeń wejściowych. Pokazujemy, że oprócz dobrze znanych zagadnień, z którymi cierpią takie wskaźniki, pojawia się dodatkowy problem przy stosowaniu tych wskaźników do oceny AMR-to-text, ponieważ abstrakcyjna reprezentacja znaczenia pozwala na liczne realizacje powierzchniowe. W niniejszej pracy dążymy do złagodzenia tych problemów, proponując _omarozkładalną metrykę, która opiera się na dwóch filarach. Pierwszą z nich jest zasada zachowania znaczenia: mierzy ona, w jakim stopniu dany AMR może zostać zrekonstruowany z wygenerowanego zdania za pomocą parserów SOTA AMR i stosuje (drobnoziarniste) wskaźniki oceny AMR do pomiaru odległości między oryginalnym a zrekonstruowanym AMR. Drugi filar opiera się na zasadzie formy (gramatycznej) mierzącej jakość językową generowanego tekstu, którą wdrażamy za pomocą modeli językowych SOTA. W dwóch obszernych badaniach pilotażowych pokazujemy, że spełnienie obu zasad oferuje korzyści dla oceny AMR-to-text, w tym wyjaśnialność wyników. Ponieważ _ niekoniecznie polega na złotych AMR, może rozszerzyć się na inne zadania generowania tekstu.', 'si': 'Name අපි පෙන්වන්නේ හොඳින් දන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්, AMR-ට-ට-ට-පාළ්ණ විශ්නය වෙනුවෙන්  මේ වැඩේ අපි අදහස් කරනවා මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අඩු කරන්න  , ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න  , ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් මෙට්\u200d මුලින්ම තමයි අදහස් සුරක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරධානය : ඒක අවශ්\u200dය කරන්න පුළුවන් SOTA AMR පරිස්සර් සහ (සුරක්ෂණය) AMR පරීක්ෂණය මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් සහ ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහ දෙවෙනි ස්තූතියක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා (ගර්මාතික) ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වලින්  ∙ ඒකෙන් නිර්මාණය කරපු පාළුවේ භාෂාවික කුමත්වය අව අපි පෙන්වන්නේ විශේෂ පයිලෝට් අධ්\u200dයානය දෙකක් වලින් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් දෙන්නම් ප්\u200dරවේශනය AMR-ට-පාළුවට පරික්ෂණය ස මොකද    ෙරතුරු AMRs වලින් විශ්වාස කරන්නේ නැහැ, ඒක අනිත් පාළ පිළිබඳ වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන්.', 'ro': 'Sistemele care generează text în limbaj natural din reprezentări abstracte ale semnificațiilor, cum ar fi AMR, sunt de obicei evaluate folosind metrici automate de potrivire a suprafeței care compară textele generate cu textele de referință din care au fost construite reprezentările semnificației de intrare. Aratăm că pe lângă problemele bine cunoscute de care suferă astfel de metrici, apare o problemă suplimentară atunci când aplicăm aceste metrici pentru evaluarea AMR-la-text, deoarece o reprezentare abstractă a semnificației permite numeroase realizări de suprafață. În această lucrare ne propunem să atenuăm aceste probleme prin propunerea _ , o metrică descompusă care se bazează pe doi piloni. Primul este principiul păstrării semnificației: măsoară în ce măsură un anumit AMR poate fi reconstruit din propoziția generată folosind analizoare SOTA AMR și aplicând măsurători de evaluare AMR (cu granule fine) pentru a măsura distanța dintre AMR original și AMR reconstruit. Al doilea pilon se bazează pe principiul formei (gramaticale) care măsoară calitatea lingvistică a textului generat, pe care îl implementăm folosind modele lingvistice SOTA. În două studii pilot ample, demonstrăm că îndeplinirea ambelor principii oferă beneficii pentru evaluarea AMR-la-text, inclusiv explicabilitatea scorurilor. Deoarece _ nu se bazează neapărat pe AMR-uri aurii, se poate extinde la alte sarcini de generare de text.', 'sr': 'Sistemi koji stvaraju prirodni jezik tekst iz abstrakta značenja poput AMR obično se procjenjuju koristeći automatske površine odgovarajuće metrike koje uspoređuju proizvedene tekste sa referentnim tekstima iz kojih su konstruirane predstavljanja ulaznog značenja. Pokazujemo da osim poznatih pitanja iz kojih takva metrika pati, dodatni problem se pojavljuje kada se primjenjuje ove metrike za procjenu AMR-na-teksta, pošto apstraktno značenje omogućava mnogim stvaranjima površine. U ovom poslu imamo cilj da ublažimo te probleme predložeći  , razdvojiti metriku koja se izgradi na dva stupa. Prvi je princip očuvanja značenja : mjera u kolikoj mjeri dati AMR može se rekonstruisati iz proizvedene rečenice koristeći SOTA AMR parsere i primjenjivanje (fino zrno) AMR procjene metrika za mjerenje udaljenosti između originalnog i rekonstruiranog AMR. Drugi stup se osnova na principu (gramatičkog) forme koji mjeri jezičku kvalitetu proizvedenog teksta, koju implementiramo koristeći SOTA jezičke modele. U dva široka ispitivanja pilota pokazujemo da ispunjenje oba principa nudi koristi za procjenu AMR-a-teksta, uključujući objašnjivost rezultata. Pošto   ne mora da se oslanja na zlatne AMR-e, može da se proširi na drugi zadatak generacije teksta.', 'so': "Isticmaalka soo saarta qoraalka afka asalka ah ee ka soo jeeda waxyaabaha ka mid ah AMR waxaa lagu qiimeeyaa isticmaalka dhulka bilowga ah oo u eg metriciyada, kaas oo isbarbarbardhiga qorniinka laga sameeyay qoraalka reference ee laga sameeyo macluumaadka laga sameeyo macnaheedu waxyaabaha laga sameeyo. Waxaynu muujinnaa in ka sokow dhibaatooyin aad u yaqaan oo ay ka xanuunsadaan metriciyada, dhibaato dheer ayaa soo socda marka lagu codsanayo metricadan AMR-to-text qiimeynta, sababtoo ah mid ka mid ah maamulka la xiriiro waxay u ogolaadaa garashada dhulka badan. Shaqadan ayaan u baahan nahay inuu fududeeyo arimahan, soo jeedo , metrici aan la koobi karin oo ku dul dhisaya laba tiir. The first is the principle of meaning preservation   : it measures to what extent a given AMR can be reconstructed from the generated sentence using SOTA AMR parsers and applying (fine-grained) AMR evaluation metrics to measure the distance between the original and the reconstructed AMR.  Tirada labaad wuxuu ku dhisaa kaneecada (grammatical) foomka (grammatical) kaasoo qiyaasa qiimaha luuqadda ee qoraalka la soo daayay, kaas oo aynu ku soo dejinaynaa qaababka afka SOTA. Labada waxbarasho ee pilotelyada oo ballaadhan ayaannu tusnaynaa in dhamaadka labada shuruudaha ah ay faa'iido u bixiyaan qiimeynta qoraalka AMR-iyo-qoraalka, kuwaas oo ah faa'iidada kooxaha. Sida uu _ si qasab ah uma xirna AMRs dahab ah, waxay u sii wadi kartaa hawsha farshaxan kale.", 'ur': "سیسٹم جنہوں نے طبیعی زبان کے متعلق مطلب معنی سے پیدا کئے ہیں جیسے AMR کی مطلب سے اتمام سطح مطابق میٹریک کے مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق ہے جو پیدا کئے ہوئے متقابل متقابل سے متقابل متقابل متقابل متقابل متقابل ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ان معلوم موضوع کے علاوہ جن سے یہ متریک مصیبت پہنچتی ہیں، جب ان متریکیوں کو AMR-to-text evaluation کے لئے استعمال کرتا ہے، اس لئے کہ ایک مصیبت معنی کی تعریف بہت سی سطح واقعیت کے لئے اجازت دیتا ہے. اس کام میں ہم نے ان مسائل کو آسان کرنے کا ارادہ کیا ہے                      ،ایک متریک جو دو ستونوں پر بناتا ہے۔ پہلی مطلب حفاظت کی تعریف ہے : اس کا اندازہ کس اندازہ تک دیئے گئے AMR سے دوبارہ ساختہ کر سکتے ہیں SOTA AMR پارس کے مطابق اور (نیک دانے) AMR ارزیابی متریک کے مطابق مقرر کر سکتے ہیں کہ اصلی اور دوبارہ ساختہ AMR کے درمیان فاصلہ اندازے کے لئے۔ دوسرا ستونر ایک فرم کے قانون پر بنتا ہے جو پیدا ہوئے متن کے زبان کی کیفیت کا اندازہ کرتا ہے، جسے ہم SOTA زبان مدل کے مطابق استعمال کرتے ہیں. دو گھیرے پایلوٹ کی تحقیقات میں ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ دونوں اصل کا پورا ہونا AMR-to-text evaluation کے لئے فائدہ پہنچاتا ہے، اور اسکور کی توضیح کے ساتھ بھی۔ Since   doesn't necessarily rely on gold AMRs, it may extend to other text generation tasks.", 'sv': 'System som genererar naturligt språk text från abstrakta betydelserepresentationer som AMR utvärderas vanligtvis med hjälp av automatiska ytmatchningsmätningar som jämför de genererade texterna med referenstexter från vilka indata betydelserepresentationer konstruerades. Vi visar att förutom välkända problem som sådana mätvärden lider av uppstår ytterligare ett problem när man tillämpar dessa mätvärden för AMR-till-text utvärdering, eftersom en abstrakt betydelserepresentation möjliggör många ytrealiseringar. I detta arbete syftar vi till att lindra dessa problem genom att föreslå _, ett nedbrytbart mått som bygger på två pelare. Den första är principen om bevarande av betydelse: den mäter i vilken utsträckning en given AMR kan rekonstrueras från den genererade meningen med hjälp av SOTA AMR-tolkare och tillämpar (finkorniga) AMR-utvärderingsmetoder för att mäta avståndet mellan den ursprungliga och den rekonstruerade AMR. Den andra pelaren bygger på en princip om (grammatisk) form som mäter den språkliga kvaliteten på den genererade texten, som vi implementerar med hjälp av SOTA språkmodeller. I två omfattande pilotstudier visar vi att uppfyllandet av båda principerna ger fördelar för AMR-till-text utvärdering, inklusive förklaringar av poäng. Eftersom _ inte nödvändigtvis är beroende av guld AMR, kan det utvidgas till andra textgenereringsuppgifter.', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழி உரையை வெளிப்பாட்டிலிருந்து உருவாக்கும் அமைப்புகள் AMR போன்ற தானியங்கி மேல் பொருந்தும் மெட்ரிக்களை பயன்படுத்தி மதிப்பிடப்படுகிறது. இது உருவா இந்த மெட்ரிக்கள் போன்ற பிரச்சனைகளை காண்பிக்கும் பொழுது, AMR-ல் இருந்து உரை மதிப்பினை பயன்படுத்தும்போது கூடுதல் பிரச்சனை ஏற்படும், ஏனெனில் ஒரு ஒது இந்த வேலையில் நாம் இந்த பிரச்சனைகளை எளிதாக்க வேண்டும் , இரண்டு தூண்டுகள் மீது கட்டும் ஒரு குறைவான மெட்ரிக். The first is the principle of meaning preservation   : it measures to what extent a given AMR can be reconstructed from the generated sentence using SOTA AMR parsers and applying (fine-grained) AMR evaluation metrics to measure the distance between the original and the reconstructed AMR.  இரண்டாவது தூண்டு (சிகிராமிக்) வடிவத்தின் தலைப்பின் மீது கட்டுகிறது - அது உருவாக்கப்பட்ட உரையின் மொழியின் மொழியின் மொழிமாற்று தரம் நி இரண்டு விரிவான பைலட்டு ஆய்வுகளில் நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் இவ்விரண்டு குறிப்புகளின் முடிவு AMR-ல் இருந்து உரை மதிப்பின ஏனென்றால்   தங்கத்தை AMRகள் மீது நம்பாது, அது மற்ற உரை தலைமுறை பணிகளுக்கு நீட்டலாம்.', 'vi': 'Những hệ thống tạo văn bản ngôn ngữ tự nhiên từ các biểu tượng có ý nghĩa trừu tượng như kiểu AMR thường được đánh giá bằng các thước đo khớp mặt tự động so sánh các văn bản đã tạo ra với các văn bản tham khảo mà các biểu hiện ý nghĩa nhập được tạo ra. Chúng tôi cho thấy ngoài những vấn đề phổ biến mà các đo hồ đo bị chi tiết chi tiết, còn có thêm vấn đề khi áp dụng các thước đo đo đo đo đo đo đo đo cho đánh giá AMR-to-text, vì một đại diện mang ý nghĩa trừu tượng cho nhiều sự hiện thực trên bề mặt. Chúng tôi muốn giảm bớt những vấn đề này bằng cách đề xuất ra một thước đo phân hủy xây dựng trên hai trụ. Đầu tiên là nguyên tắc bảo tồn: nó xác định cho mức độ xây dựng một dạng AMR nào có thể được tái tạo từ câu tạo bằng các phân tử SOTA AMR và áp dụng âm lượng giá trị AMR để đo khoảng cách giữa bản gốc và AMR phục hồi. Cái cột thứ hai dựa trên một nguyên tắc hình thức (ngôn ngữ) đề định chất lượng ngôn ngữ của văn bản đã được tạo ra, mà chúng tôi thực hiện bằng cách sử dụng các mô hình ngôn ngữ SOTA. Trong hai nghiên cứu phi công rộng lớn, chúng tôi cho thấy việc hoàn thành cả hai nguyên tắc có lợi cho đánh giá AMR-to-text, bao gồm có khả năng rõ điểm số. Do đâu tự nhiên nó không dựa vào kim loại, nó có thể bao gồm những nhiệm vụ sản xuất văn bản khác.', 'uz': "Name Biz buni ko'rsatganimizni ko'rsatganimiz, bu metriklarni AMR-matn qiymatiga qo'shish uchun qoʻshimcha muammolar sodir bo'ladi, chunki abstrakt taʼminlovchisi ko'pgina javob tashqarishga ruxsat beradi. Bu ishda biz bu muammolarni ko'paytirishni istaysizki, , ikki guruhda yaratib boʻlmaydigan metrik. The first is the principle of meaning preservation   : it measures to what extent a given AMR can be reconstructed from the generated sentence using SOTA AMR parsers and applying (fine-grained) AMR evaluation metrics to measure the distance between the original and the reconstructed AMR.  Ikkinchi tiil qoidadagi (grammatika) shaklida yaratadi. Bu yaratilgan matnning lingvistik сифатini oʻzgartiradi. Biz SOTA tili modellari yordamida bajaramiz. Ikkita ko'p pilot tahrirchida biz ikkita qoidalarni bajarish imkoniyatini ko'rsatamiz, bu ikkita qoidalarni AMR- dan matn qiymatlariga imkoniyatlarni bajaradi, va scorning imkoniyatini bajarishi mumkin. Chunki  aslida AMR yuqori narsalarini ishlatmaydi, bu boshqa matn generalining vazifalarini oshirishi mumkin.", 'da': "Systemer, der genererer naturligt sprog tekst fra abstrakte meningsrepræsentationer som AMR, evalueres typisk ved hjælp af automatiske overfladematerialer, der sammenligner de genererede tekster med referencetekster, hvorfra input betydning repræsentationer blev konstrueret. Vi viser, at ud over velkendte problemer, som sådanne metrics lider af, opstår et yderligere problem ved anvendelse af disse metrics til AMR-til-tekst evaluering, da en abstrakt betydning repræsentation giver mulighed for talrige overfladebehandlinger. I dette arbejde har vi til formål at afhjælpe disse problemer ved at foreslå _ , en nedbrydelig metric, der bygger på to søjler. Det første er princippet om bevarelse af betydningen: det måler i hvilket omfang en given AMR kan rekonstrueres ud fra den genererede sætning ved hjælp af SOTA AMR fortolkere og anvende (finkornede) AMR evalueringsmetrics til at måle afstanden mellem den oprindelige og den rekonstruerede AMR. Den anden søjle bygger på et princip om (grammatisk) form, der måler den sproglige kvalitet af den genererede tekst, som vi implementerer ved hjælp af SOTA-sprogmodeller. I to omfattende pilotundersøgelser viser vi, at opfyldelse af begge principper giver fordele for AMR-til-tekst evaluering, herunder forklarelighed af scores. Da _ ikke nødvendigvis er afhængig af guld AMR'er, kan det omfatte andre tekstgenereringsopgaver.", 'bg': 'Системите, които генерират текст на естествен език от абстрактни представи на значението, като например АМР, обикновено се оценяват с помощта на автоматични показатели за съвпадение на повърхността, които сравняват генерираните текстове с референтните текстове, от които са изградени входните представи на значението. Показваме, че освен добре познати проблеми, от които страдат такива показатели, възниква и допълнителен проблем при прилагането на тези показатели за оценка на АМР към текст, тъй като абстрактното представяне на значението позволява многобройни повърхностни реализации. В тази работа ние се стремим да облекчим тези проблеми, като предложим разложим се метрик, който се основава на два стълба. Първият е принципът на запазване на значението: той измерва до каква степен дадена АМР може да бъде реконструирана от генерираното изречение с помощта на анализатори и прилагане на (фино зърнести) измервателни показатели за измерване на разстоянието между оригиналната и реконструираната АМР. Вторият стълб се основава на принципа на (граматическа) форма, който измерва езиковото качество на генерирания текст, който прилагаме с помощта на езикови модели СОТА. В две обширни пилотни проучвания ние показваме, че изпълнението на двата принципа предлага ползи за оценката на АМР към текст, включително обяснимостта на оценките. Тъй като _ не разчита непременно на златни АМР, то може да обхване и други задачи за генериране на текст.', 'nl': "Systemen die natuurlijke taal tekst genereren uit abstracte betekenisrepresentaties zoals AMR worden meestal geëvalueerd met behulp van automatische oppervlaktematching metrics die de gegenereerde teksten vergelijken met referentieteksten waaruit de invoerbetekenisrepresentaties zijn opgebouwd. We laten zien dat naast bekende problemen waar dergelijke metrics last van hebben, er een extra probleem ontstaat bij het toepassen van deze metrics voor AMR-to-text evaluatie, aangezien een abstracte betekenisrepresentatie talrijke oppervlakterealisaties mogelijk maakt. In dit werk proberen we deze problemen te verlichten door _odadecomposable metric voor te stellen die voortbouwt op twee pijlers. Het eerste is het principe van betekenisbehoud: het meet in hoeverre een bepaalde AMR gereconstrueerd kan worden uit de gegenereerde zin met behulp van SOTA AMR parsers en het toepassen van (fijnkorrelige) AMR evaluatiemetrics om de afstand tussen de oorspronkelijke en de gereconstrueerde AMR te meten. De tweede pijler bouwt voort op een principe van (grammaticale) vorm dat de linguïstische kwaliteit van de gegenereerde tekst meet, dat we implementeren met behulp van SOTA taalmodellen. In twee uitgebreide pilotstudies laten we zien dat naleving van beide principes voordelen biedt voor AMR-to-text evaluatie, waaronder verklarbaarheid van scores. Aangezien _ niet noodzakelijkerwijs afhankelijk is van gouden AMR's, kan het zich uitbreiden tot andere taken voor het genereren van tekst.", 'de': 'Systeme, die natursprachlichen Text aus abstrakten Bedeutungsreprﾃ､sentationen wie AMR generieren, werden typischerweise mithilfe automatischer Oberflﾃ､chenabgleichsmetriken ausgewertet, die die generierten Texte mit Referenztexten vergleichen, aus denen die Eingabebedeutungsreprﾃ､sentationen konstruiert wurden. Wir zeigen, dass neben bekannten Problemen, unter denen solche Metriken leiden, bei der Anwendung dieser Metriken fﾃｼr die AMR-to-Text-Auswertung ein zusﾃ､tzliches Problem auftritt, da eine abstrakte Bedeutungsdarstellung zahlreiche Oberflﾃ､chenrealisierungen ermﾃｶglicht. In dieser Arbeit versuchen wir, diese Probleme zu lindern, indem wir eine zerlegbare Metrik vorschlagen, die auf zwei Sﾃ､ulen aufbaut. Das erste ist das Prinzip der Bedeutungserhaltung: Es misst, inwieweit ein bestimmter AMR aus dem generierten Satz mithilfe von SOTA AMR Parsern rekonstruiert werden kann, und wendet (feinkﾃｶrnige) AMR Evaluationsmetriken an, um den Abstand zwischen dem Original und dem rekonstruierten AMR zu messen. Die zweite Sﾃ､ule baut auf einem Prinzip der (grammatischen) Form auf, das die sprachliche Qualitﾃ､t des erzeugten Textes misst, welches wir mit SOTA-Sprachmodellen umsetzen. In zwei umfangreichen Pilotstudien zeigen wir, dass die Erfﾃｼllung beider Prinzipien Vorteile fﾃｼr die AMR-to-Text-Bewertung bietet, einschlieﾃ殕ich Erklﾃ､rbarkeit von Scores. Da _ nicht unbedingt auf Gold-AMRs angewiesen ist, kann es sich auch auf andere Textgenerierungsaufgaben erstrecken.', 'id': 'Sistem yang menghasilkan teks bahasa alami dari represisi arti abstrak seperti AMR biasanya dievaluasi menggunakan metrik otomatis yang cocok permukaan yang membandingkan teks yang dihasilkan dengan teks referensi dari mana represisi arti input dibangun. We show that besides well-known issues from which such metrics suffer, an additional problem arises when applying these metrics for AMR-to-text evaluation, since an abstract meaning representation allows for numerous surface realizations.  In this work we aim to alleviate these issues by proposing   _ , a decomposable metric that builds on two pillars.  Pertama adalah prinsip konservasi artinya : ia mengukur seberapa jauh AMR yang diberikan dapat dibangun kembali dari kalimat yang dihasilkan dengan menggunakan parser SOTA AMR dan menerapkan metrik evaluasi AMR (berwarna gandum) untuk mengukur jarak antara original dan rekonstruksi AMR. Pilar kedua dibangun pada prinsip bentuk (grammatik) yang mengukur kualitas bahasa dari teks yang dibuat, yang kami implementasikan menggunakan model bahasa SOTA. In two extensive pilot studies we show that fulfillment of both principles offers benefits for AMR-to-text evaluation, including explainability of scores.  Since   _  does not necessarily rely on gold AMRs, it may extend to other text generation tasks.', 'ko': 'AMR과 같은 추상적 의미 표현에서 자연 언어 텍스트를 생성하는 시스템은 일반적으로 자동 표면 일치 메트릭을 사용하여 평가합니다. 메트릭은 생성된 텍스트를 입력 의미 표현을 작성하는 참조 텍스트와 비교합니다.이러한 메트릭에 대해 잘 알려진 문제 외에 이러한 AMR 메트릭을 텍스트 평가에 적용할 때 추상적 의미가 많은 표면적 실현을 허용하기 때문에 또 다른 문제가 발생할 수 있음을 나타냅니다.이 작업에서, 우리는 이 문제들을 완화시키기 위해 두 가지 기둥을 바탕으로 하는 분해 가능한 도량을 제시했다.첫 번째는 SOTA AMR 해석기를 사용하여 생성된 문장에서 지정된 AMR을 재구성하는 정도를 측정하고, AMR 평가 지표를 적용하여 원래 AMR과 재구성 AMR 사이의 거리를 측정합니다.두 번째 기둥은 (문법) 형식 원칙을 바탕으로 이 원칙은 텍스트를 생성하는 언어의 질을 평가하고 우리는 SOTA 언어 모델로 실현한다.두 가지 광범위한 시범 연구에서 우리는 이 두 가지 원칙의 실현이 AMR에서 텍스트까지의 평가에 점수의 해석성을 포함하여 좋은 점을 제공했다고 밝혔다.반드시 Gold AMR에 의존하는 것은 아니므로 다른 텍스트 생성 작업으로 확장할 수 있습니다.', 'sw': 'Systems that generate natural language text from abstract meaning representations such as AMR are typically evaluated using automatic surface matching metrics that compare the generated texts to reference texts from which the input meaning representations were constructed.  Tunaonyesha kwamba pamoja na masuala maarufu yanayotokana na mitindo kama haya, tatizo la ziada linatokea wakati wa kutumia mbinu hizi kwa ajili ya kutathmini ujumbe wa AMR-hadi ujumbe wa maneno, kwa sababu uwakilishi wa maudhui yanaruhusu kutambua watu wengi. Katika kazi hii tunakusudia kupunguza masuala haya kwa kupendekeza  , mbinu isiyopungua inayojenga kwenye nguzo mbili. Kwanza ni kanuni ya kuhifadhia maana : inaweza kufanya hatua kwa kiasi gani AMR inavyopewa inaweza kujengwa tena kutoka hukumu iliyotengenezwa kwa kutumia mabunge ya SOTA AMR na kutumia mbinu za uchunguzi wa AMR ili kupima umbali kati ya asili na zile zilizojengwa tena AMR. Kitizo cha pili kinajenga kanuni ya aina ya (grammatiki) inayopima kiwango cha lugha cha ujumbe uliotengenezwa, ambacho tunatekeleza kwa kutumia mifano ya lugha ya SOTA. Katika utafiti wa pili mbili wa kina tunaonyesha kwamba Kutimiza kanuni hizo mbili zinatoa faida kwa ajili ya utafiti wa maneno ya AMR, ikiwa ni pamoja na ufafanuzi wa score. Tangu  haina lazima kutegemea AMRs za dhahabu, inaweza kuongezeka kwa kazi nyingine za kizazi cha maandishi.', 'tr': "Natal dili oluşan sistemler AMR ýaly abstrakt möhümlerinden, meýdança metinleri ullanylýar. Olar içeri meýdança metinleri oluşan metinleri we referens metinlerine karşılaşýar. Biz bu metrilerin acı çeken bilinen meselelerden başka bir sorun daha da gösteriyoruz. Bu metrileri AMR'e-metin değerlendirmesi için uygularken, çünkü abstrakt bir anlam sayısı yüzeysel gerçekleşenlere yarayan bir mesele var. Bu işde biz bu meseleleri   , iki süpürde inşa etýän bir metrik maslahat bilen azaltmak amaçlandyrys. Ilkinji möhüm goramagyň prinsipi  : bu prinsipi berilen AMR üýtgeýän sözleden SOTA AMR parserýularyny ulanyp we (fin-grain) AMR deňleme metrikleriniň soragynyň we täzeden AMR aralygyny ölçürmek üçin düzenlenýär. Ikinji sanat SOTA dil nusgalaryndan ullanýan (gramatik) şeklinde guruldy. Iki golaý pilot öwrenmesinde biz iki prinsip doldurulmasynda AMR-dan tekst değerlendirmesi üçin faydaly tapar diýip görkeýäris. _", 'fa': 'سیستم\u200cهایی که متن زبان طبیعی را از معنی مطلوب تولید می\u200cکنند، مثل AMR، معمولاً با استفاده از سطح خودکار با متریک\u200cهایی که متن\u200cهای تولید شده\u200cاند، با متن\u200cهای متن\u200cاشاره\u200cای که معنی ورودی از آن ساخته شده\u200cاند، مقایسه می\u200cکنند. ما نشان می دهیم که به علاوه از مسائل معلوم که این متریک ها از آن رنج می دهند، یک مشکل اضافی در زمانی که این متریک ها را برای ارزیابی متن AMR به متن انجام می دهد، زیرا یک معنی مطلق به معنی مطلق اجازه می دهد که واقعیت های زیادی سطح را انجام می دهد. در این کار ما هدف داریم که این مسائل را با پیشنهاد  , کمتر کنیم . یک متریک متری که بر دو ستون ساخته می شود . اولین اصل حفاظت معنی است : آن اندازه\u200cگیری می\u200cکند تا چه اندازه\u200cای که یک AMR داده می\u200cشود از جمله\u200cی تولید شده با استفاده از متخصص SOTA AMR و استفاده از متخصص ارزیابی AMR برای اندازه\u200cگیری فاصله بین اولین و AMR بازساخته می\u200cشود. ستون دوم بر اساس فرم (گراماتیک) ساخته می\u200cشود که کیفیت زبان\u200cشناسی متن تولید شده را اندازه می\u200cدهد، که با استفاده از مدل زبان SOTA عملکرد می\u200cکنیم. در دو مطالعه خلبان گسترده نشان می دهیم که تحمل هر دو اصل سودی برای ارزیابی AMR به متن می دهد، شامل توضیح قابلیت امتیاز. از آنجا که   لازم نیست به AMR طلا اعتماد کند، ممکن است به کار دیگر نسل متن تغییر دهد.', 'sq': 'Sistemet që gjenerojnë tekst të gjuhës natyrore nga përfaqësimet abstrakte të kuptimeve të tilla si AMR janë vlerësuar tipikisht duke përdorur metrika automatike të përshtatshme sipërfaqes që krahasojnë tekstet e gjeneruar me tekstet e referimit nga të cilat janë ndërtuar përfaqësimet e kuptimeve të hyrjes. Ne tregojmë se përveç çështjeve të njohura nga të cilat vuajnë metrika të tilla, një problem shtesë vjen kur zbatohen këto metrika për vlerësimin AMR-në-tekst, pasi një përfaqësim abstrakt i kuptimit lejon për realizime të shumta sipërfaqe. Në këtë punë ne synojmë të lehtësojmë këto çështje duke propozuar , një metrik të dekompozueshëm që ndërtohet në dy shtylla. Së pari është parimi i ruajtjes së kuptimit  : ajo masa në çfarë mase një AMR të caktuar mund të rindërtohet nga fjala e gjeneruar duke përdorur analizuesit SOTA AMR dhe duke aplikuar (të hollë) metrikat e vlerësimit AMR për të matur distancën midis origjinales dhe AMR të rindërtuar. Piloni i dytë mbështetet në një parim të form ës (grammatike) që masa cilësinë gjuhësore të tekstit të gjeneruar, që ne e zbatojmë duke përdorur modelet e gjuhës SOTA. Në dy studime të zgjeruara pilote ne tregojmë se përmbushja e të dy parimeve ofron përfitime për vlerësimin AMR-në-tekst, duke përfshirë shpjeguesinë e rezultateve. Meqë   nuk mbështetet domosdoshmërisht në AMR të artë, ajo mund të shtrihet në detyra të tjera të gjenerimit të tekstit.', 'am': 'የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ጽሑፎችን ከabstract ማሰናከል የሚያደርገው ሲስተም እንደአ.አ.R. በተለመደው የፍጥረት ጽሑፎችን ለመተካከል በመጠቀም በሚያስተካክሉ ማተሚያዎች ይታያል፡፡ እንደዚህ ያሉት ማተሚያዎች መከራን ከታወቁ ጉዳዮች በቀር፣ እነዚህን ማተሚያዎች ለAMR-ለጽሑፍ ማስታወቂያ በመጠቀም ጊዜ የሚጨመር ጉዳይ ይደርሳል፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ በሁለቱ አዕማድ ላይ የሚሠራ የማይጎድል ሚትሪክ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ መጀመሪያው የአማላዊው መጠበቅ ነው ፡ - የአሜሪክ ክፍል ከታወቀው ክፍል ከSOTA AMR ፓርስር በመጠቀም እና በመጠቀም የAMR ማስታወቂያ ሚትርክቶችን በመጀመሪያው እና በተገኘው አሜሪካ እና በተመሠረቱት አሜሪካ መካከል ርቀቱን ለመለካት ይችላል፡፡ ሁለተኛው ዓምድ በ (grammatical) መልክ ላይ ይሠራል፡፡ በሁለት ተጨማሪ ፕላይት ትምህርት ውስጥ የሁለቱን የሥርዓቶች መፈጸም የአሜሪካ-የጽሑፍ ማስታወቂያውን እናሳየዋለን፡፡ ከ  በወርቅ አሜሪካ ላይ በማይታመን ግድ ከሌሎች የጽሑፍ ትውልድ አድራጊዎች ይዘረጋል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այն համակարգերը, որոնք ստեղծում են բնական լեզվի տեքստ վերացական նշանակության ներկայացումներից, ինչպիսիք են AMR, սովորաբար գնահատվում են օգտագործելով ավտոմատիկ մակերեսին համապատասխանող մետրիկներ, որոնք համեմատում են ստեղծված տեքստները և համեմատում են հա Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ բացի հայտնի հարցերից, որոնց վրա տառապում է նման չափումները, ավելին խնդիր է առաջանում, երբ այս չափումները կիրառվում են AMR-ի տեքստի գնահատման համար, քանի որ վերացական նշանակության ներկայացումը հնարավորություն է տալիս բազմաթիվ մակերևու Այս աշխատանքի մեջ մենք նպատակով ենք նվազեցնել այս խնդիրները, առաջարկելով , բաժանելի մետրիկ, որը հիմնված է երկու սյունների վրա: Առաջինը նշանակության պահպանության սկզբունքն է. այն չափում է, թե ինչքանով կարող է որոշակի AMR-ը վերակառուցել ստեղծված նախադասությունից օգտագործելով SOta AMR-ի վերարտադրողներ և օգտագործելով (նրբագեղ) AMR-ի գնահատման մետրիկներ՝ չափելու համար սկզբնական և վերակառուց The second pillar builds on a principle of (grammatical) form    that measures the linguistic quality of the generated text, which we implement using SOTA language models.  Երկու էքսպենսիվ փորձարկվող ուսումնասիրություններում մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ երկու սկզբունքների իրականացումը օգուտ է տալիս AMR-ի տեքստի գնահատման համար, ներառյալ գնահատականների բացատրելիությունը: Քանի որ  անհրաժեշտ չի հիմնված ոսկու AMR-ների վրա, այն կարող է ընդլայնվել այլ տեքստի ստեղծման խնդիրների վրա:', 'az': "AMR kimi t…ôbi…ôtli dil m…ôtnl…ôrini abstrakt anlamńĪndan yaradan sisteml…ôr, t…ôbi…ôtli m…ôtnl…ôrin m…ôtnl…ôrini, m…ôlumatlarńĪn inŇüa edildiyi m…ôtnl…ôrin m…ôlumatlarńĪna saldńĪran avtomatik y√ľz…ô il…ô istifad…ô edilir. Biz g√∂st…ôririk ki, bu metrikl…ôrd…ôn baŇüqa tanńĪnmńĪŇü m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôr istisna olmaqla, bu metrikl…ôri AMR-…ô-metin deńüerlendirm…ôsin…ô uyńüunlaŇüdńĪrmaq √ľ√ß√ľn artńĪq bir m…ôs…ôl olar, √ß√ľnki abstraktlńĪ m…ôs…ôl g√∂st…ôricisi √ßoxlu y√ľzeyd…ô reaksiyonlara imkan verir. Bu iŇüd…ô biz bu m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôri …ôskiltm…ôk ist…ôyirik  , iki s√ľtun √ľst√ľnd…ô inŇüa edil…ôn bir metrik t…ôklif ed…ôr…ôk . ńįlk d…ôyiŇüiklik t…ôhl√ľk…ôsizlik m…ôs…ôlin…ô istifad…ô edil…ôn m…ôs…ôlin…ô g√∂r…ô AMR veril…ôn m…ôs…ôl…ôd…ôn SOTA AMR parsers vasit…ôsil…ô yenid…ôn inŇüa edil…ô bil…ôr v…ô AMR t…ôhl√ľk…ôsizlik m…ôs…ôlin…ô uygulayńĪb t…ôhl√ľk…ôsizlik m…ôs…ôlin…ô ilk d…ôyiŇüiklik v…ô yenid…ôn inŇüa edilmiŇü AMR arasńĪndakńĪ m…ôsaf…ôni √∂l√ß√ľy…ô bil…ôr . ńįkinci s√ľtun SOTA dil modell…ôri il…ô istifad…ô etdiyimiz m…ôlumatńĪn dill…ôrin keyfiyy…ôtini √∂l√ß√ľy…ôn (gramatik) bir prinsipi il…ô inŇüa edir. ńįki geniŇü pilot t…ôcr√ľb…ôl…ôrind…ô h…ôr ikisinin t…ôcr√ľb…ôsinin yerin…ô yetirm…ôsi AMR-ya-metin t…ôcr√ľb…ôsinin faydalarńĪnńĪ verir, m√ľ…ôyy…ôn edilm…ôsini d…ô dahil ed…ôrik. √á√ľnki   altńĪn AMR'l…ôr…ô t…ôv…ôkk√ľl etmirdi, bu da baŇüqa m…ôtn n…ôslin…ô t…ôr…ôf uzanabilir.", 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার টেক্সট তৈরি করা সিস্টেম যেমন AMR এর প্রতিনিধিত্ব থেকে প্রতিনিধিত্ব তৈরি করা হয় স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মিট্রিকের মাধ্যমে মূল্ আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে পরিচিত বিষয়গুলোর পরিবর্তে এমআর-থেকে টেক্সট মুল্যায়নের জন্য এই মেট্রিক প্রয়োগ করার সময় আরো সমস্যা ঘটছে, যেহেতু এক অস্বাভাবিক মানে প্রতিনিধি এই কাজে আমরা এই সমস্ত ব্যাপারগুলোকে কমিয়ে দিতে চাই যে প্রস্তাব দিয়ে , যা দুটি সুন্দরে নির্মাণ করে। The first is the principle of meaning preservation   : it measures to what extent a given AMR can be reconstructed from the generated sentence using SOTA AMR parsers and applying (fine-grained) AMR evaluation metrics to measure the distance between the original and the reconstructed AMR.  দ্বিতীয় স্থান নির্মাণ করে (গ্রাম্যাটিক্যাল) ফর্মের একটি নীতিতে (গ্রাম্যাটিক্যাল) যা তৈরি করা লেখার ভাষায় ভাষাগত মান পরিমাপ করে,  দুই বিস্তারিত পাইলট গবেষণায় আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই দুই নীতির পূর্ণ প্রতিষ্ঠান এমআর-থেকে টেক্সট মূল্যায়নের জন্য সুবিধা প্ যেহেতু সোনা এমআরসের উপর নির্ভর করে না। এটি অন্যান্য টেক্সট প্রজন্মের কাজে বাড়তে পারে।', 'hr': 'Sistemi koji stvaraju prirodni jezik tekst iz abstraktivnog značenja poput AMR obično se procjenjuju koristeći automatske površine odgovarajuće metrike koje uspoređuju proizvedene tekste sa referentnim tekstima iz kojih su konstruirani predstavljanja ulaznog značenja. Mi pokazujemo da osim dobro poznatih pitanja iz kojih takva metrika pati, dodatni problem se pojavljuje kada se primjenjuje te metrike za procjenu AMR-na-tekst, jer apstraktno značenje omogućava brojnim stvaranjima površine. U ovom poslu ciljamo ublažiti te probleme predložeći  , razdvojiti metriku koja se izgradi na dva stupa . Prvi je način očuvanja značenja : mjera se u kolikoj mjeri dati AMR može se rekonstruirati iz proizvedene rečenice koristeći SOTA AMR analizatore i primjenjivati (fino zrno) AMR procjene metrike za mjerenje udaljenosti između originalnog i rekonstruiranog AMR. Drugi stup se temelji na principu (gramatičkog) oblika koji mjeri jezičku kvalitetu proizvedenog teksta, koju implementiramo koristeći SOTA jezičke modele. U dva široka ispitivanja pilota pokazujemo da ispunjavanje oba principa nudi koristi za procjenu AMR-a-teksta, uključujući objašnjenje rezultata. Budući da   ne mora da se oslanja na zlatne AMR-e, može se proširiti na drugi zadatak generacije teksta.', 'bs': 'Sistemi koji proizvode prirodni jezik tekst iz abstrakta značenja poput AMR obično se procjenjuju koristeći automatske površine odgovarajuće metrike koje uspoređuju proizvođene tekste sa referentnim tekstima iz kojih su konstruirane predstavljanja ulaznog značenja. Mi pokazujemo da osim poznatih pitanja iz kojih takva metrika pati, dodatni problem se pojavljuje kada se primjenjuje te metrike za procjenu AMR-na-teksta, jer apstraktno značenje omogućava mnogim stvaranjima površine. U ovom poslu ciljamo ublažiti te probleme predložeći  , razdvojiti metriku koja se izgradi na dva stupa. Prvi je princip očuvanja značenja : mjera u kolikoj mjeri dati AMR može se rekonstruirati iz proizvedene rečenice koristeći SOTA AMR parsere i primjenjivanje (fino zrno) AMR procjene metrika kako bi izmjerila udaljenost između originalnog i rekonstruiranog AMR. Drugi stup se temelji na principu (gramatičkog) oblika koji mjeri jezičku kvalitetu proizvedenog teksta, koju implementiramo koristeći SOTA jezičke modele. U dva široka ispitivanja pilota pokazujemo da ispunjenje oba principa nudi koristi za procjenu AMR-a-teksta, uključujući objašnjenje rezultata. Budući da se   ne nužno oslanja na zlatne AMR-e, može se proširiti na drugi zadatak generacije teksta.', 'ca': "Els sistemes que generen textos de llenguatge natural a partir de representacions de significat abstract com AMR s'evaluen típicament utilitzant mètriques automàtiques d'ajustament de superfície que comparan els textos generats amb textos de referència a partir dels quals es van construir representacions de significat d'entrada. We show that besides well-known issues from which such metrics suffer, an additional problem arises when applying these metrics for AMR-to-text evaluation, since an abstract meaning representation allows for numerous surface realizations.  En aquest treball busquem aliviar aquests problemes proposant  , una mètrica descomposable que es basa en dos pilars. El primer és el principi de la preservació del sentit : mesura en quin punt una determinada AMR pot ser reconstruida de la frase generada usant analitzadors SOTA AMR i aplicant les mètriques d'evaluació (fins granats) AMR per mesurar la distància entre l'original i l'AMR reconstruit. El segon pilar es basa en un principi de form a (gramàtica) que mesura la qualitat lingüística del text generat, que implementem usant models lingüístics SOTA. En dos estudis pilots extensos demostram que el cumplir dels dos principis ofereix beneficis per a l'evaluació AMR-text, incloent l'explicabilitat de les puntuacions. Com que  no necessariament es basa en AMR d'or, pot estendre-se a altres tasques de generació de text.", 'af': "Stelsels wat natuurlike taal teks genereer van abstrakte betekening voorstellings soos AMR word tipies uitgewerk met automatiese oorspronklike ooreenstemmende metries wat vergelyk die genereerde teks na verwysing teks van waarvan die invoer betekening voorstellings was konstrukteer. Ons wys dat, behalwe goed bekende probleme waarvan sodanige metries lyk, 'n addisionele probleem kom wanneer hierdie metries toewend word vir AMR-na-teks-evaluering, omdat 'n abstrakte betekening verteenwoording toelaat vir menigte oorspronklike realisasies. In hierdie werk doen ons doel om hierdie probleme te allevier deur  , te voorstel  , â\x80\x99n ontkopbare metrie wat op twee pilare bou. Die eerste is die prinsipe van betekening opslaan : dit maak tot wat uitbreiding ' n gegewe AMR kan wees herkonstrukteer van die genereerde seting gebruik SOTA AMR verwerkers en toepassing (fyn-graan) AMR evaluering metries om die afstand tussen die oorspronklike en die herkonstrukteerde AMR te maak. Die tweede pilar bou op 'n prinsipe van (grammatiese) vorm wat die lingwisiese kwaliteit van die genereerde teks maak, wat ons implementeer met die gebruik van SOTA taal modele. In twee uitbreidige pilot studie wys ons dat volvulling van beide prinsipes voordeel vir AMR-na-teks evaluasie, insluitend verduidelikheid van punte. Omdat   nie noodsaaklik op goud AMR vertrou nie, kan dit uitbrei na ander teks generasie taak.", 'cs': 'Systémy, které generují text přirozeného jazyka z abstraktních významných reprezentací, jako je AMR, jsou obvykle hodnoceny pomocí automatických metrik porovnávání povrchu, které porovnávají generované texty s referenčními texty, ze kterých byly vytvořeny reprezentace vstupních významů. Ukazujeme, že kromě známých problémů, kterými tyto metriky trpí, vzniká další problém při aplikaci těchto metrik pro hodnocení AMR-to-text, neboť abstraktní reprezentace významu umožňuje mnoho povrchových realizací. V této práci si klademe za cíl zmírnit tyto problémy navrhnutím rozkladatelné metriky, která staví na dvou pilířích. Prvním je princip zachování významu: měří, do jaké míry lze daný AMR rekonstruovat z generované věty pomocí SOTA AMR parserů a aplikací (jemnozrnných) AMR hodnotících metrik pro měření vzdálenosti mezi originálem a rekonstruovaným AMR. Druhý pilíř staví na principu (gramatické) formy, který měří jazykovou kvalitu generovaného textu, který implementujeme pomocí jazykových modelů SOTA. Ve dvou rozsáhlých pilotních studiích ukazujeme, že splnění obou principů přináší výhody pro hodnocení AMR-to-text, včetně vysvětlitelnosti skóre. Jelikož _ nemusí nutně spoléhat na zlaté AMR, může se rozšířit i na další úlohy generování textu.', 'et': 'Süsteeme, mis genereerivad looduskeelset teksti abstraktsetest tähendustest, nagu näiteks AMR, hinnatakse tavaliselt automaatse pinnasobitamise mõõdikute abil, mis võrdlevad genereeritud tekste viitetekstidega, millest sisendtähendused on ehitatud. Näitame, et lisaks tuntud probleemidele, millest sellised mõõdikud kannatavad, tekib nende mõõdikute rakendamisel AMR-i-teksti hindamisel veel üks probleem, kuna abstraktne tähenduseesitus võimaldab arvukalt pinnarealiseerimisi. Selles töös eesmärk on leevendada neid probleeme, pakkudes _ , lagunev mõõdik, mis põhineb kahel sambal. Esimene on tähenduse säilitamise põhimõte: see mõõdab, mil määral saab antud AMR-i genereeritud lausest rekonstrueerida, kasutades SOTA AMR-i parsereid ja rakendades (peeneteraalisi) AMR-i hindamismeetodeid, et mõõta kaugust originaali ja rekonstrueeritud AMR-i vahel. Teine sammas tugineb (grammatilise) vormi põhimõttele, mis mõõdab genereeritud teksti keelelist kvaliteeti, mida rakendame SOTA keelemudelite abil. Kahes ulatuslikus pilootuuringus näitame, et mõlema põhimõtte täitmine pakub kasu AMR-i tekstiks hindamisele, sealhulgas hinnangute selgitatavusele. Kuna _ ei tugine tingimata kuldsetele AMR-idele, võib see laieneda teistele tekstiloomise ülesannetele.', 'fi': 'Järjestelmät, jotka tuottavat luonnollista tekstiä abstrakteista merkitysesityksistä, kuten AMR, arvioidaan tyypillisesti käyttämällä automaattisia pintavastaavuusmetrikoita, jotka vertaavat luotuja tekstejä viiteteksteihin, joista syötteen merkitysesitteet rakennettiin. Osoitamme, että tunnettujen ongelmien lisäksi, joista tällaiset mittarit kärsivät, syntyy myös lisäongelma sovellettaessa näitä mittaristoja AMR-tekstiin-arviointiin, koska abstrakti merkitysesitys mahdollistaa lukuisia pintarealisointeja. Tässä työssä pyrimme lievittämään näitä ongelmia ehdottamalla _ , hajoava metriikka, joka perustuu kahteen pilariin. Ensimmäinen on merkityksen säilyttämisen periaate: se mittaa, missä määrin tietty AMR voidaan rekonstruoida luodusta lauseesta käyttämällä SOTA AMR-jäsentimiä ja käyttämällä (hienorakeisia) AMR-arviointimetriikkaa alkuperäisen ja rekonstruoidun AMR-etäisyyden mittaamiseksi. Toinen pilari perustuu (kielioppisen) muodon periaatteeseen, joka mittaa tuotetun tekstin kielellistä laatua ja jonka toteutamme SOTA-kielimallien avulla. Kahdessa laajassa pilottitutkimuksessa osoitamme, että molempien periaatteiden täyttyminen tarjoaa etuja AMR-tekstiarvioinnissa, mukaan lukien pisteiden selittävyys. Koska _ ei välttämättä perustu kultaisiin AMR-tietoihin, se voi ulottua myös muihin tekstien luontitehtäviin.', 'jv': 'System Awak dhéwé éntuk pernik-pernik sing diangkat sabanjuré iki dadi, ngono kesemplo sing wis nambah kanggo nggawe barang-ne-teks nggawe barang iki, dadi sing pernik diangkat sabanjuré nggawe barang langgar. Nang gawar iki, kita lak nggalakno kanggo ngejaraké iki dadi supoyo , dadi iki dadi nggawe barang iki pilar. Awak dhéwé sing peremple sing dipunangé pergunian : iso disenyungé karo segondé dipunangé AM R iso nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas barang nggawe barang kelas barang soko dolang nggunakake dipunangé (bonne-graned) AM R dipunangé metika kanggo meh disenyungé terus tanggal nggawe Orijinal lan nggawe barang dumadhi AM. Pilar wis rampung nggawe ing pernik (gram) Dino duruha gambar pilot sing wong liyane Sugeng   ora bisa dianteksi kanggo nambah pulan iki-nambah, iki dadi wis ngupakan seneng operasi sing wis kelangan teks.', 'sk': 'Sistemi, ki ustvarjajo besedilo v naravnem jeziku iz abstraktnih pomenskih predstavitev, kot je AMR, se običajno ocenjujejo z uporabo samodejnih meritev ujemanja površin, ki ustvarjajo ustvarjena besedila z referenčnimi besedili, iz katerih so bile zgrajene predstavitve vhodnega pomena. Pokazali smo, da se poleg znanih težav, zaradi katerih trpijo takšne meritve, pojavi dodatna težava pri uporabi teh meritev za ocenjevanje AMR-v-besedilo, saj abstraktna predstavitev pomena omogoča številne površinske realizacije. V tem delu želimo ublažiti te težave s predlaganjem _ , razgradljive metrike, ki temelji na dveh stebrih. Prvo je načelo ohranjanja pomena: meri, v kolikšni meri je dana AMR mogoče rekonstruirati iz ustvarjenega stavka z uporabo razčlenjevalnikov SOTA AMR in uporabo (drobnozrnatih) meritev AMR za merjenje razdalje med originalno in rekonstruirano AMR. Drugi steber temelji na načelu (slovnične) oblike, ki meri jezikovno kakovost ustvarjenega besedila, ki ga izvajamo z uporabo jezikovnih modelov SOTA. V dveh obsežnih pilotnih študijah smo pokazali, da izpolnjevanje obeh načel prinaša koristi za oceno AMR-v-tekst, vključno z pojasnljivostjo ocen. Ker _ ni nujno odvisen od zlatih AMR, se lahko razširi na druge naloge ustvarjanja besedila.', 'ha': "Systemi da ke ƙãga littãfin harshen asiyya daga manyan abubuwan, kamar AMR, ana ƙaddara su yi amfani da shiryoyin fuskar kwamfyutan da ke daidaita metrics da ke daidaita, da daidaita matsayin da aka ƙidida zuwa misalin littãfin da aka tsare, daga which an gina maɓallin ayukan inputan da aka sanar da su. Tuna nũna cewa, baka masu da aka sani daga masu da waɗannan metrics ke cũtar da su, wata masĩfa ta samu idan za'a yi amfani da waɗannan metrics wa AMR-zuwa-text evaluation, kwani idan an sami karatun da maɓallin akwatin bayani na yarda da masu gane masu yawa. Daga wannan aikin, Munã nufin mu sauƙa ƙe masu al'amarin da za'a buƙata , wata metric wanda bã ya samu'a kan karatun biyu. Kila farko yana da kimar tsarin ma'anar : yana taki zuwa a tsakanin da aka bai wa AMR za'a rekodi shi daga cewa wanda aka haife shi na zartar da parser na SOTA AMR da kuma ya yi amfani da metric evaluation na AMR dõmin ya cika tsakanin asili da wanda aka rekonsa AMR. Giron na biyu na samar a kan wani kanuni (grammatisk) form ) wanda ke iya ƙayyade tsarin linguistic na littãfin da aka ƙãga, da wanda Muke amfani da misãlai na SOTA. Daga karatun biyu masu cikin jarrabãwa biyu masu faɗi, tuna nũna cewa cikakken kanuni biyu na bãyar da amfani ga muhalli na AMR-zuwa-matsayin, da kuma an bayyana fassarar nau'i. Tana da  ba ya ƙayyade a kan AMR ya zama ana dõgara zuwa wasu aikin matsayi.", 'he': 'מערכות שמוצרות טבעי טקסט שפה ממוצאות משמעות אוסטרקטית, כמו AMR, בדרך כלל מתערכות באמצעות מטריות מתאימות פנים אוטומטיות אשר שווות את הטקסטים שנוצרים לטקסטים התייחסות ממנו נבנו התוצאות המשמעות הכניסה. אנו מראים כי חוץ מהבעיות הידועות מכן מטריקה כזו סובלת, בעיה נוספת נוצרת כאשר אפשר להשתמש במטריקות אלה עבור הערכה AMR-לטקסט, מאחר שהמייצג משמעותית אוסטרקטית מאפשר להבינה מרובה על פני השטח. בעבודה הזו אנו מתכוונים להקל על הנושאים האלה על ידי הצעה , מטריקה מקוmposable שמבונה על שני עמודים. הראשון הוא העקרון של משמר המשמעות : הוא מדד עד כמה AMR מסוים ניתן לבנות מחדש מהמשפט המיוצר באמצעות מעבדות SOTA AMR ולהשתמש במטריקות הערכה של AMR (צפופונות) כדי למדוד את המרחק בין המקורי לבין AMR המיוצר. העמוד השני בונה על עקרון של צורה (גרמטית) שמדואג את איכות השפה של הטקסט המיוצר בשני מחקרים טייסיים רחבים אנחנו מראים שהמילוי של שני העקרונות מציע יתרונות עבור הערכה AMR-לטקסט, כולל הסבר של נקודות. מכיוון  לא בהכרח תלוי על AMR זהב, הוא יכול להתרחב למשימות דורת טקסט אחרות.', 'bo': 'Systems that generate natural language text from abstract meaning representations such as AMR are typically evaluated using automatic surface matching metrics that compare the generated texts to reference texts from which the input meaning representations were constructed. We show that besides well-known issues from which such metrics suffer, an additional problem arises when applying these metrics for AMR-to-text evaluation, since an abstract meaning representation allows for numerous surface realizations. In this work we aim to alleviate these problems by proposing  , a decomposable metric that builds on two pillars. With the goal of creating a new technology, we need to build on these issues by proposing  , a decomposable metric that builds on two pillars. The first is the principle of meaning preservation  : it measures to what extent a given AMR can be reconstructed from the generated sentence using SOTA AMR parsers and applying (fine-grained) AMR evaluation metrics to measure the distance between the original and the reconstructed AMR. The first is the principle of meaning preservation : The second pillar builds on a principle of (grammatical) form ། that measures the linguistic quality of the generated text, which we implement using SOTA language models. In two extensive pilot studies we show that fulfillment of both principles offers benefits for AMR-to-text evaluation, including explainability of scores. See also    རྒྱ་གཞུང་གིས་རྒྱ་གཞི་AMRལ་ཡོད་པ་ལས་དེ་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་མི་འབྲི་བའི་བྱ་འགུལ་གཞན་ཞིག་ལ་ཁྱབ་ཆོག་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'The Source-Target Domain Mismatch Problem in Machine Translation', 'pt': 'O problema de incompatibilidade de domínio de origem-destino na tradução automática', 'es': 'El problema de la discordancia entre el dominio origen-destino en la traducción automática', 'fr': 'Le problème de discordance entre les domaines source-cible dans la traduction automatique', 'ar': 'مشكلة عدم تطابق المجال الهدف المصدر في الترجمة الآلية', 'zh': '机器翻译中之源-非匹也', 'ja': '機械翻訳におけるソース-ターゲットドメインの不一致の問題', 'hi': 'स्रोत-लक्ष्य डोमेन बेमेल समस्या मशीन अनुवाद में', 'ru': 'Проблема несоответствия исходного и целевого доменов при машинном переводе', 'ga': 'An Fhadhb um Mímheaitseáil Fearainn Foinse-Sprioc san Aistriúchán Meaisín', 'el': 'Το πρόβλημα αναντιστοιχίας τομέα πηγής-στόχου στη μηχανική μετάφραση', 'ka': 'მისამართი დომენის მისამართი პრობლემა მაქსინის გადამყარებაში', 'hu': 'A forrás-cél tartomány nem megfelelő probléma a gépi fordításban', 'it': 'Il problema di mancata corrispondenza del dominio sorgente-destinazione nella traduzione automatica', 'kk': 'Машин аудармасында көзі- мақсатты доменге сәйкес келмейді', 'lt': 'Šaltinio ir tikslinio domeno neatitikimo mašin ų vertimo srityje problema', 'mk': 'The Source-Target Domain Mismatch Problem in Machine Translation', 'ms': 'Masalah Mismatch Domain Sumber-Sasaran dalam Terjemahan Mesin', 'ml': 'മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷയിലെ സോര്\u200dസ്സ്- ലക്ഷ്യം ഡോമെന്\u200d മിസ്സിന്\u200d പ്രശ്നം', 'mt': 'Il-problema ta’ nuqqas ta’ tqabbil bejn is-sors u d-dominju fil-mira fit-traduzzjoni tal-makkinarju', 'mn': 'Машин хөгжүүлэлтийн эх үүсвэр-зорилготой домаар ялгаатай асуудал', 'pl': 'Problem niedopasowania domeny źródłowo-docelowej w tłumaczeniu maszynowym', 'ro': 'Problema neconcordanței domeniului sursă-țintă în traducerea automată', 'sr': 'Problem sa prevodom mašine', 'so': 'Isticmaalka', 'si': 'මුළු ලක්ෂණ ඩෝමේන් අවවාදයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්', 'sv': 'Problemet med felaktig matchning av käll- och måldomän i maskinöversättning', 'ta': 'மூலம்- இலக்கு களம் பொருத்தமில்லை இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பில்', 'ur': 'ماشین ترجمہ میں سراسر-تاریک ڈومین غیرمطابق مشکل', 'no': 'Problemet med kjeldemåldomsetjinga ikkje passar i maskineomsetjinga', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Câu hỏi « Nguồn đích » trong việc dịch cỗ máy', 'bg': 'Проблемът с несъответствието на домейна източник-цел в машинния превод', 'nl': 'Het probleem van de afwijking van het brondoeldomein bij machinevertaling', 'da': 'Problemet med mismatch mellem kilde og mål-domæne i maskinoversættelse', 'hr': 'Problem s nepovladanjem domena izvora- cilja u prevodu strojeva', 'de': 'Das Problem der Diskrepanz zwischen Quell- und Zieldomänen in der maschinellen Übersetzung', 'id': 'Masalah Mismatch Domain Sumber-Target dalam Translation Mesin', 'ko': '질문', 'fa': 'مشکل مختلف دامین منبع- هدف در ترجمه ماشین', 'sw': 'Tatizo la Tatizo la Kishinikizo la Domain', 'sq': 'Problemi i gabimit të domenit burim-objektiv në përkthimin e makinës', 'tr': 'Maşynyň terjimesinde Menb-Mazmunlar Aýratyn Mesele', 'af': 'Die Bron- doel Domein Onooreenstemmende Problem in Masjien Vertaling', 'am': 'የመድረክ ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Գործիքի և նպատակի բնագավառի անհամապատասխանությունը մեքենայի թարգմանման խնդիր է', 'bn': 'মেশিন অনুবাদের সূত্র- টার্গেট ডোমেইন মিস্টেম সমস্যা', 'az': 'Maşın Tərcümələrində Məqsəd Domena Səblənməsi Problemi', 'ca': "El problema d'incompatibilitat entre el domini de font i l'objectiu en la traducció de màquines", 'bs': 'Problem sa prevodom mašine', 'cs': 'Problém nesouladu zdrojové a cílové domény v strojovém překladu', 'et': 'Allika-sihtdomeeni mittevastavuse probleem masintõlkes', 'fi': 'Source-Target Domain -ristiriidan ongelma konekäännöksessä', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'he': 'בעיה לא מתאימה למקור-מטרה בתרגום מכונות', 'sk': 'Težava z neusklajenostjo domene vira in cilja v strojnem prevajanju', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'རྒྱུ་དངོས་འགྲོ་ཡུལ་གྱི་དྲ་ཁོངས་འདིའི་ལག་འཁོར་ལ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་མི་མཐུན་པ'}
{'en': 'While we live in an increasingly interconnected world, different places still exhibit strikingly different cultures and many events we experience in our every day life pertain only to the specific place we live in. As a result, people often talk about different things in different parts of the world. In this work we study the effect of local context in machine translation and postulate that this causes the domains of the source and target language to greatly mismatch. We first formalize the concept of source-target domain mismatch, propose a metric to quantify it, and provide empirical evidence for its existence. We conclude with an empirical study of how source-target domain mismatch affects training of machine translation systems on low resource languages. While this may severely affect back-translation, the degradation can be alleviated by combining back-translation with self-training and by increasing the amount of target side monolingual data.', 'es': 'Si bien vivimos en un mundo cada vez más interconectado, diferentes lugares todavía exhiben culturas sorprendentemente diferentes y muchos eventos que experimentamos en nuestra vida diaria se refieren solo al lugar específico en el que vivimos. Como resultado, la gente suele hablar de cosas diferentes en diferentes partes del mundo. En este trabajo estudiamos el efecto del contexto local en la traducción automática y postulamos que esto hace que los dominios del idioma de origen y el idioma de destino no coincidan en gran medida. Primero formalizamos el concepto de discordancia entre dominios de origen y destino, proponemos una métrica para cuantificarla y proporcionamos evidencia empírica de su existencia. Concluimos con un estudio empírico sobre cómo la discordancia entre el dominio fuente-destino afecta la capacitación de los sistemas de traducción automática en idiomas de escasos recursos. Si bien esto puede afectar gravemente a la retrotraducción, la degradación se puede aliviar combinando la retrotraducción con el autoaprendizaje y aumentando la cantidad de datos monolingües del lado objetivo.', 'fr': "Alors que nous vivons dans un monde de plus en plus interconnecté, différents lieux présentent encore des cultures remarquablement différentes et de nombreux événements que nous vivons dans notre vie quotidienne ne concernent que l'endroit précis dans lequel nous vivons. En conséquence, les gens parlent souvent de choses différentes selon les régions du monde. Dans ce travail, nous étudions l'effet du contexte local dans la traduction automatique et postulons que cela entraîne une grande discordance entre les domaines de la langue source et de la langue cible. Nous formalisons d'abord le concept d'inadéquation entre les domaines source-cible, proposons une métrique pour le quantifier et fournir des preuves empiriques de son existence. Nous concluons par une étude empirique de la façon dont l'inadéquation entre le domaine source et le domaine cible affecte la formation des systèmes de traduction automatique sur des langues à faibles ressources. Bien que cela puisse sérieusement affecter la rétro-traduction, la dégradation peut être atténuée en combinant la rétro-traduction avec l'auto-apprentissage et en augmentant la quantité de données monolingues côté cible.", 'ar': 'بينما نعيش في عالم مترابط بشكل متزايد ، لا تزال الأماكن المختلفة تعرض ثقافات مختلفة بشكل لافت للنظر والعديد من الأحداث التي نعيشها في حياتنا اليومية تتعلق فقط بالمكان المحدد الذي نعيش فيه. ونتيجة لذلك ، يتحدث الناس غالبًا عن أشياء مختلفة في أجزاء مختلفة من العالم. في هذا العمل ، ندرس تأثير السياق المحلي في الترجمة الآلية ونفترض أن هذا يتسبب في عدم تطابق مجالات اللغة المصدر والهدف إلى حد كبير. نقوم أولاً بإضفاء الطابع الرسمي على مفهوم عدم تطابق المجال الهدف المصدر ، ونقترح مقياسًا لتحديده كميًا ، وتقديم دليل تجريبي على وجوده. نختتم بدراسة تجريبية لكيفية تأثير عدم تطابق المجال الهدف المصدر على تدريب أنظمة الترجمة الآلية على اللغات منخفضة الموارد. في حين أن هذا قد يؤثر بشدة على الترجمة الخلفية ، يمكن التخفيف من التدهور من خلال الجمع بين الترجمة الخلفية والتدريب الذاتي وعن طريق زيادة كمية البيانات أحادية اللغة الجانبية المستهدفة.', 'pt': 'Enquanto vivemos em um mundo cada vez mais interconectado, lugares diferentes ainda exibem culturas notavelmente diferentes e muitos eventos que vivenciamos em nossa vida diária dizem respeito apenas ao lugar específico em que vivemos. o mundo. Neste trabalho estudamos o efeito do contexto local na tradução automática e postulamos que isso faz com que os domínios do idioma de origem e de destino sejam muito incompatíveis. Primeiro formalizamos o conceito de incompatibilidade de domínio fonte-alvo, propomos uma métrica para quantificá-lo e fornecemos evidências empíricas de sua existência. Concluímos com um estudo empírico de como a incompatibilidade de domínio de origem e destino afeta o treinamento de sistemas de tradução automática em linguagens de poucos recursos. Embora isso possa afetar gravemente a retrotradução, a degradação pode ser aliviada combinando a retrotradução com o autotreinamento e aumentando a quantidade de dados monolíngues do lado alvo.', 'ja': '私たちはますます相互につながりのある世界に住んでいますが、さまざまな場所では依然として顕著に異なる文化を示しており、私たちが毎日経験する多くのイベントは、私たちが住んでいる特定の場所にのみ関連しています。そのため、世界のさまざまな場所でさまざまなことを話すことがよくあります。この研究では、機械翻訳におけるローカルコンテキストの影響を研究し、これによりソース言語とターゲット言語のドメインが大きく不一致になると仮定します。私たちはまず、ソース-ターゲットドメインの不一致の概念を形式化し、それを定量化するための指標を提案し、その存在について実証的な証拠を提供します。ソースとターゲットのドメインの不一致が、低資源言語における機械翻訳システムのトレーニングにどのように影響するかについての実証的な研究で締めくくります。これは、逆翻訳に深刻な影響を与える可能性があるが、逆翻訳と自己訓練を組み合わせることによって、およびターゲット側の単語データの量を増加させることによって、劣化を緩和することができる。', 'hi': 'जबकि हम एक तेजी से परस्पर जुड़ी दुनिया में रहते हैं, अलग-अलग स्थान अभी भी अलग-अलग संस्कृतियों को प्रदर्शित करते हैं और कई घटनाएं जो हम अपने हर दिन के जीवन में अनुभव करते हैं, केवल उस विशिष्ट स्थान से संबंधित हैं जहां हम रहते हैं। नतीजतन, लोग अक्सर दुनिया के विभिन्न हिस्सों में अलग-अलग चीजों के बारे में बात करते हैं। इस काम में हम मशीन अनुवाद में स्थानीय संदर्भ के प्रभाव का अध्ययन करते हैं और यह मानते हैं कि यह स्रोत और लक्ष्य भाषा के डोमेन को बहुत बेमेल करने का कारण बनता है। हम पहले स्रोत-लक्ष्य डोमेन बेमेल की अवधारणा को औपचारिक रूप देते हैं, इसे मापने के लिए एक मीट्रिक का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, और इसके अस्तित्व के लिए अनुभवजन्य सबूत प्रदान करते हैं। हम एक अनुभवजन्य अध्ययन के साथ निष्कर्ष निकालते हैं कि स्रोत-लक्ष्य डोमेन बेमेल कम संसाधन भाषाओं पर मशीन अनुवाद प्रणालियों के प्रशिक्षण को कैसे प्रभावित करता है। हालांकि यह बैक-ट्रांसलेशन को गंभीर रूप से प्रभावित कर सकता है, लेकिन आत्म-प्रशिक्षण के साथ बैक-ट्रांसलेशन के संयोजन और लक्ष्य पक्ष मोनोलिंगुअल डेटा की मात्रा बढ़ाकर गिरावट को कम किया जा सकता है।', 'ru': 'В то время как мы живем во все более взаимосвязанном мире, в разных местах все еще демонстрируются поразительно разные культуры, и многие события, которые мы переживаем в нашей повседневной жизни, относятся только к конкретному месту, в котором мы живем. В результате люди часто говорят о разных вещах в разных частях мира. В этой работе мы изучаем влияние локального контекста в машинном переводе и постулируем, что это приводит к значительному несоответствию доменов исходного и целевого языка. Сначала мы формализуем концепцию несоответствия исходного и целевого доменов, предлагаем метрику для его количественной оценки и предоставляем эмпирические доказательства его существования. Мы завершаем эмпирическим исследованием того, как несоответствие исходного и целевого доменов влияет на обучение систем машинного перевода на языках с низким ресурсом. Хотя это может серьезно повлиять на обратную трансляцию, деградацию можно облегчить, сочетая обратную трансляцию с самообучением и увеличивая объем данных целевой стороны на одном языке.', 'zh': '虽日系世界,而异处有截然之文,经历多事,惟关特定处。 是以人常言异世。 于是考本地上下文于机器翻译,假令语言之域,殊不侔矣。 首以源-域不配之名形式化,建一量化之指标,而资其经验。 究竟一实究源-不匹配低资源言语机器翻译系统。 虽或影响回译,将回译与自练合,及以增侧单语数据量,可以纾退化。', 'ga': 'Cé go mairimid i ndomhan atá ag éirí níos idirnasctha, tá cultúir thar a bheith éagsúil fós le feiceáil in áiteanna éagsúla agus baineann go leor imeachtaí a fheicimid inár saol laethúil amháin leis an áit ar leith ina mairimid. Mar thoradh air sin, is minic a labhraíonn daoine faoi rudaí éagsúla i gcodanna éagsúla de. an domhain. Sa obair seo déanaimid staidéar ar éifeacht an chomhthéacs áitiúil san aistriúchán meaisín agus deirimid go n-eascraíonn sé seo go mór le fearainn na foinse agus na sprioctheanga. Déanaimid ar dtús an coincheap de mhímheaitseáil fearainn foinse-sprioc a chur ar bhonn foirmiúil, molaimid méadrach chun é a chainníochtú, agus cuirimid fianaise eimpíreach ar fáil maidir lena bheith ann. Críochnóimid le staidéar eimpíreach ar an gcaoi a mbíonn tionchar ag neamh-chomhoiriúnú fearainn foinse-sprioc ar oiliúint na gcóras aistriúcháin meaisín ar theangacha lagacmhainne. Cé go bhféadfadh sé seo cur isteach go mór ar chúlaistriúchán, is féidir an díghrádú a mhaolú trí chúlaistriúchán a chomhcheangal le féinoiliúint agus trí mhéadú a dhéanamh ar an méid sonraí aonteangacha ar an taobh sprice.', 'ka': 'თუმცა ჩვენ ცხოვრობთ უფრო მეტი კონტაქტიური მსოფლიოში, განსხვავებული ადგილები უფრო განსხვავებულია კულტურები და მრავალი მოვლენები, რომელიც ჩვენი ყოველ დღეს ცხოვრებაში გვაქვს მ შემდეგ, ადამიანები მსოფლიოს განსხვავებული ნაწილებში მხოლოდ განსხვავებული რამეების შესახებ. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ ლოკალური კონტექსტის ეფექტის მაქსინური გაგრძელებაში და პოსტულაციაში ვისწავლოთ, რომ ეს იქნება სამუშაო და მინიშნალური ენის დემონის ძ ჩვენ პირველად ფორმალურად გავაკეთებთ მსოფლიო დემომინის კონფიგურაციას, გავაკეთებთ მეტრიკის კვანტიფიკაციას, და მისი არსებობისთვის ემპერიკური წარმო ჩვენ გადასრულებთ იმპერიკალური სწავლებით თუ როგორ მსოფლიო მისაღების დემონი არ შეიძლება მაქსინური გადასრულების სისტემის განაკეთებას ჩვენ მაგრამ ეს შესაძლებელია ძალიან გარგება დაბრუნდეს, დეგრადიაცია შეიძლება გახსნა, რომ დაბრუნდეს დაბრუნდეს თავისუფლებით და მონოლენგური მონაცემების ზომის გარგებით.', 'el': 'Ενώ ζούμε σε έναν όλο και περισσότερο διασυνδεδεμένο κόσμο, διαφορετικά μέρη εξακολουθούν να παρουσιάζουν εντυπωσιακά διαφορετικούς πολιτισμούς και πολλά γεγονότα που βιώνουμε στην καθημερινή μας ζωή αφορούν μόνο τον συγκεκριμένο τόπο στον οποίο ζούμε. Ως αποτέλεσμα, οι άνθρωποι συχνά μιλούν για διαφορετικά πράγματα σε διαφορετικά μέρη του κόσμου. Σε αυτή την εργασία μελετάμε την επίδραση του τοπικού πλαισίου στη μηχανική μετάφραση και θέτουμε ότι αυτό προκαλεί μεγάλη ασυμφωνία μεταξύ των τομέων της γλώσσας προέλευσης και του στόχου. Πρώτα επισημοποιούμε την έννοια της αναντιστοιχίας πηγής-στόχου τομέα, προτείνουμε μια μέτρηση για την ποσοτικοποίηση της και παρέχουμε εμπειρικά στοιχεία για την ύπαρξή της. Ολοκληρώνουμε με μια εμπειρική μελέτη του πώς η αναντιστοιχία πηγής-στόχου επηρεάζει την εκπαίδευση συστημάτων μηχανικής μετάφρασης σε γλώσσες χαμηλού πόρου. Ενώ αυτό μπορεί να επηρεάσει σοβαρά την οπισθοδρομική μετάφραση, η υποβάθμιση μπορεί να ανακουφιστεί συνδυάζοντας την οπισθοδρομική μετάφραση με την αυτοεκπαίδευση και αυξάνοντας την ποσότητα των μονογλωσσικών δεδομένων από την πλευρά του στόχου.', 'hu': 'Miközben egyre inkább összekapcsolódó világban élünk, a különböző helyek még mindig feltűnően különböző kultúrákat mutatnak be, és számos esemény, amit a mindennapi életünkben tapasztalunk, csak arra a konkrét helyre vonatkozik, ahol élünk. Ennek eredményeként az emberek gyakran beszélnek különböző dolgokról a világ különböző részein. Ebben a munkában tanulmányozzuk a helyi kontextus hatását a gépi fordításban, és feltételezzük, hogy ez a forrás- és célnyelv tartományai nagymértékben eltérnek. Először formalizáljuk a forrás-cél tartomány eltérésének fogalmát, javasolunk egy metrikát annak számszerűsítésére, és empirikus bizonyítékokat szolgáltatunk annak létezésére. Egy empirikus tanulmánnyal zárjuk, hogy a forrás-cél tartomány eltérése hogyan befolyásolja a gépi fordítási rendszerek képzését alacsony erőforrású nyelveken. Bár ez súlyosan befolyásolhatja a visszafordítást, a romlás enyhíthető a visszafordítás és az önképzés kombinációjával és a céloldali egynyelvű adatok mennyiségének növelésével.', 'it': "Mentre viviamo in un mondo sempre più interconnesso, luoghi diversi mostrano ancora culture sorprendentemente diverse e molti eventi che sperimentiamo nella nostra vita quotidiana riguardano solo il luogo specifico in cui viviamo. Di conseguenza, le persone parlano spesso di cose diverse in diverse parti del mondo. In questo lavoro studiamo l'effetto del contesto locale nella traduzione automatica e postuliamo che ciò causa i domini della lingua di origine e di destinazione a disallineamenti notevolmente. Per prima cosa formalizziamo il concetto di disallineamento del dominio sorgente-target, proponiamo una metrica per quantificarlo e forniamo prove empiriche per la sua esistenza. Concludiamo con uno studio empirico su come il disallineamento del dominio sorgente-target influisce sulla formazione dei sistemi di traduzione automatica su lingue a basso contenuto di risorse. Anche se questo può influenzare gravemente la traduzione posteriore, il degrado può essere alleviato combinando la traduzione posteriore con l'auto-allenamento e aumentando la quantità di dati monolingui sul lato target.", 'kk': 'Біз әлемдегі көптеген көптеген әлемде тұрғанда, әлі түрлі жерлер әлемдегі әртүрлі мәдениеттерді көрсетеді, әрбір күндік өмірімізде тұратын көптеген оқиғалар тек өміріміздің к Сол үшін адамдар әлемдегі түрлі бөліктерде әртүрлі нәрселер туралы сөйлеседі. Бұл жұмыста біз машинаның аудармасында жергілікті контекстің эффектін зерттеп, бұл көзі мен мақсатты тілдің домендерінің көп сәйкес келмейді. Біз біріншіден көзінің мақсатты доменге сәйкес келмеген концепциясын официализацияладық, оны есептеу үшін метрикалық ұсынып, оның барлығына импирикалық дәлелдер Біз мақсатты доменге қандай көздеген аудару жүйелерін төмен ресурстардың тілдеріне қалай аудару жүйелеріне әсер ететінін эмпирикалық зерттеу арқылы аяқтадық. Бұл қайта аудармасының көбірек әсері болуы мүмкін, қайта аудармасын өзіміздің оқытуымен біріктіріп, мақсатты бірнеше тілдік деректерін көбейту үшін деградацияны көмектесе алады.', 'mk': '袛芯写械泻邪 卸懈胁械械屑械 胁芯 褋茅 锌芯胁械褱械 锌芯胁褉蟹邪薪 褋胁械褌, 褉邪蟹谢懈褔薪懈褌械 屑械褋褌邪 褋茅 褍褕褌械 懈蟹谢芯卸褍胁邪邪褌 薪械胁械褉芯褬邪褌薪芯 褉邪蟹谢懈褔薪懈 泻褍谢褌褍褉懈 懈 屑薪芯谐褍 薪邪褋褌邪薪懈 泻芯懈 谐懈 懈褋泻褍褋褍胁邪屑械 胁芯 薪邪褕懈芯褌 褋械泻芯褬写薪械胁械薪 卸懈胁芯褌 褋械 芯写薪械褋褍胁邪邪褌 褋邪屑芯 薪邪 褋锌械褑懈褎懈褔薪芯褌芯 屑械褋褌芯 胁芯 泻芯械 卸懈胁械械屑械. 袣邪泻芯 褉械蟹褍谢褌邪褌 薪邪 褌芯邪, 谢褍褤械褌芯 褔械褋褌芯 蟹斜芯褉褍胁邪邪褌 蟹邪 褉邪蟹谢懈褔薪懈 褉邪斜芯褌懈 胁芯 褉邪蟹谢懈褔薪懈 写械谢芯胁懈 芯写 褋胁械褌芯褌. 袙芯 芯胁邪邪 褉邪斜芯褌邪 谐芯 锌褉芯褍褔褍胁邪屑械 械褎械泻褌芯褌 薪邪 谢芯泻邪谢薪懈芯褌 泻芯薪褌械泻褋褌 胁芯 屑邪褕懈薪褋泻懈芯褌 锌褉械胁芯写 懈 锌褉械褌锌芯褋褌邪胁褍胁邪屑械 写械泻邪 芯胁邪 锌褉械写懈蟹胁懈泻褍胁邪 谐芯谢械屑邪 薪械褋芯芯写胁械褌薪芯褋褌 薪邪 写芯屑械薪懈褌械 薪邪 懈蟹胁芯褉芯褌 懈 褬邪蟹懈泻芯褌 薪邪 褑械谢褌邪. 袩褉胁芯 谐芯 褎芯褉屑邪谢懈蟹懈褉邪屑械 泻芯薪褑械锌褌芯褌 薪邪 薪械写芯褉邪蟹斜懈褉邪褮械 薪邪 写芯屑械薪芯褌 懈蟹胁芯褉-屑械褌邪, 锌褉械写谢芯卸褍胁邪屑械 屑械褌褉懈泻邪 蟹邪 泻胁邪薪褌懈褎懈泻邪褑懈褬邪 懈 芯斜械蟹斜械写褍胁邪屑械 械屑锌懈褉懈褋泻懈 写芯泻邪蟹懈 蟹邪 薪械谐芯胁芯褌芯 锌芯褋褌芯械褮械. 袟邪胁褉褕褍胁邪屑械 褋芯 械屑锌懈褉懈褔薪邪 褋褌褍写懈褬邪 泻邪泻芯 薪械褋芯谐谢邪褋褍胁邪褮械褌芯 薪邪 写芯屑械薪芯褌 懈蟹胁芯褉-褑械谢 胁谢懈褬邪械 薪邪 芯斜褍泻邪褌邪 薪邪 屑邪褕懈薪褋泻懈褌械 锌褉械胁芯写薪懈 褋懈褋褌械屑懈 薪邪 褬邪蟹懈褑懈 褋芯 薪懈褋泻懈 褉械褋褍褉褋懈. 袠 锌芯泻褉邪褬 褌芯邪 褕褌芯 芯胁邪 屑芯卸械 褋械褉懈芯蟹薪芯 写邪 胁谢懈褬邪械 薪邪 锌褉械胁芯写芯褌 薪邪蟹邪写, 写械谐褉邪写邪褑懈褬邪褌邪 屑芯卸械 写邪 褋械 芯谢械褋薪懈 褋芯 泻芯屑斜懈薪邪褑懈褬邪 薪邪 锌褉械胁芯写芯褌 薪邪蟹邪写 褋芯 褋邪屑芯芯斜褍泻邪 懈 褋芯 蟹谐芯谢械屑褍胁邪褮械 薪邪 泻芯谢懈褔懈薪邪褌邪 薪邪 屑芯薪芯褬邪蟹懈褔薪懈 锌芯写邪褌芯褑懈 薪邪 褋褌褉邪薪邪褌邪 薪邪 褑械谢褌邪.', 'lt': 'Nors gyvename vis labiau tarpusavyje sujungtame pasaulyje, skirtingose vietose vis dar yra įspūdingai skirtingos kultūros ir daugelis įvykių, kuriuos patiriame kasdieniame gyvenime, yra susiję tik su konkrečia vieta, kurioje gyvename. Todėl žmonės dažnai kalba apie skirtingus dalykus įvairiose pasaulio dalyse. Šiame darbe tiriame vietos konteksto poveikį vertimui mašinomis ir darome prielaidą, kad dėl to šaltinio ir tikslinės kalbos sritys labai nesuderinamos. We first formalize the concept of source-target domain mismatch, propose a metric to quantify it, and provide empirical evidence for its existence.  Baigiame empiriniu tyrimu, kaip šaltinio ir tikslinės srities neatitikimas daro poveikį mašinų vertimo sistemų mokymui mažai išteklių turinčiomis kalbomis. Nors tai gali smarkiai paveikti grįžtamąjį vertimą, jo blogėjimą galima sušvelninti derinant grįžtamąjį vertimą ir savarankišką mokymą ir padidinant tikslinių vienakalbių duomenų kiekį.', 'ms': 'While we live in an increasingly interconnected world, different places still exhibit strikingly different cultures and many events we experience in our every day life pertain only to the specific place we live in.  Sebagai hasilnya, orang sering bercakap tentang perkara-perkara yang berbeza di bahagian yang berbeza di dunia. Dalam kerja ini kami mempelajari kesan konteks setempat dalam terjemahan mesin dan menyatakan bahawa ini menyebabkan domain sumber dan bahasa sasaran sangat tidak sepadan. Kami pertama-tama formalisasi konsep tidak sepadan domain sumber-sasaran, melamar metrik untuk kuantifikasikannya, dan memberikan bukti empirik untuk wujudnya. Kami menyelesaikan dengan kajian empirik bagaimana ketidakpadanan domain sumber-sasaran mempengaruhi latihan sistem terjemahan mesin pada bahasa sumber rendah. Walaupun ini boleh mempengaruhi terjemahan-belakang dengan berat, kerosakan boleh disembuhkan dengan menggabungkan terjemahan-belakang dengan latihan-sendiri dan dengan meningkatkan jumlah data monobahasa sisi sasaran.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ലോകത്തില്\u200d ജീവിക്കുന്ന സമയത്ത്, വ്യത്യസ്ത്രങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത സംസ്കാരങ്ങളിലും നമ്മുടെ ജീവിതത്തില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ  അതിന്റെ ഫലമായി, ലോകത്തിലെ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഗങ്ങളെപ്പറ്റി ആളുകള്\u200d പലപ്പോഴും സംസാരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d മെഷിന്\u200d പരിഭാഷത്തിലെ ലോക്കല്\u200d പരിഭാഗത്തിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം പഠിക്കുന്നു. ഇത് സോര്\u200dസ്സിന്റെയും ലക്ഷ്യഭ നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം സോര്\u200dസ് ലക്ഷ്യം ഡോമെന്\u200d തെറ്റുകളുടെ ആശയം ഫോര്\u200dമാറ്റി ചെയ്യുന്നു, അതിന്റെ നിലനില്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d മെട്രിക്ക് പരിശ സോര്\u200dസ്-ലക്ഷ്യം ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d തെറ്റുകള്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ് മെഷിന്\u200d പരിശീലന സിസ്റ്റം കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d പരിശീലനം പ്രയോഗിക്ക ഇത് പിന്നോട്ട് പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന് ഗുരുതരമായി പ്രഭാവിക്കുമ്പോഴും, സ്വയം പരിശീലനം കൂട്ടിക്കൊണ്ട് പിന്നോട്ട് പരിശീലന', 'mt': 'Filwaqt li ngħixu f’dinja dejjem aktar interkonnessa, postijiet differenti għadhom juru kulturi estremament differenti u ħafna avvenimenti li esperjenzaw fil-ħajja tagħna ta’ kuljum jappartjenu biss għall-post speċifiku li ngħixu fih. B’riżultat ta’ dan, in-nies spiss jitkellmu dwar affarijiet differenti f’partijiet differenti tad-dinja. F’dan ix-xogħol nistudjaw l-effett tal-kuntest lokali fit-traduzzjoni tal-magni u nistudjaw li dan jikkawża d-dominji tas-sors u tal-lingwa fil-mira għal diskrepanza kbira. L-ewwel nifformalizzaw il-kunċett ta’ diskrepanza bejn id-dominju sors u l-mira, nipproponu metrika biex nikkwantifikah, u nipprovdu evidenza empirika għall-eżistenza tiegħu. Aħna nikkonkludu bi studju empiriku dwar kif id-diskrepanza bejn id-dominju sors u l-mira taffettwa t-taħriġ tas-sistemi ta’ traduzzjoni tal-magni fuq lingwi b’riżorsi baxxi. Filwaqt li dan jista’ jaffettwa b’mod sever it-traduzzjoni lura, id-degradazzjoni tista’ titnaqqas billi tiġi kkombinata t-traduzzjoni lura ma’ taħriġ awtonomu u billi jiżdied l-ammont ta’ dejta monolingwistika fuq in-naħa fil-mira.', 'no': 'Mens vi lever i en økt sambandet verden, vil ulike plasser fortsatt vise strengt ulike kultur og mange hendingar vi opplever i vårt kvar dag liv gjelder berre det spesifikke plassen vi lever i. I resultatet snakkar folk ofte om ulike ting i ulike deler av verden. I denne arbeida studerer vi effekten av lokal kontekst i maskineoversettelsen og postulerer at domene av kjeldespråket og målspråket har stort ikkje samsvar. Vi først formaliserer konsepten for kjeldemåldområdet ikkje samsvar, foreslår ein metrisk for å kvantifiserer det, og tilbyr empiriske beviser for det eksisterende. Vi avsluttar med ein empirisk studie om korleis kjeldemål-domene ikkje passar på opplæring av maskineomsetjingssystemer på låg ressursspråk. Selv om dette kan påvirka kraftig tilbakeomsetjinga, kan degradasjonen bli alleviasert ved å kombinerera tilbakeomsetjinga med selvøving og ved å auka mengda målside-monospråk-data.', 'pl': 'Chociaż żyjemy w coraz bardziej ze sobą powiązanym świecie, różne miejsca nadal wykazują uderzająco różne kultury, a wiele wydarzeń, których doświadczamy w naszym codziennym życiu, dotyczy tylko konkretnego miejsca, w którym żyjemy. W rezultacie ludzie często mówią o różnych rzeczach w różnych częściach świata. W niniejszej pracy badamy wpływ kontekstu lokalnego w tłumaczeniu maszynowym i postulujemy, że powoduje to znaczne niedopasowanie domen języka źródłowego i docelowego. Najpierw sformalizujemy koncepcję niedopasowania domen źródłowo-docelowych, proponujemy wskaźnik do jej ilościowego określenia i dostarczamy empiryczne dowody na jej istnienie. Na zakończenie badamy empiryczne, w jaki sposób niedopasowanie domeny źródłowo-docelowej wpływa na szkolenie systemów tłumaczenia maszynowego na języki niskich zasobów. Chociaż może to poważnie wpłynąć na tłumaczenie wsteczne, degradację można złagodzić łącząc tłumaczenie wsteczne z samootreningiem oraz zwiększając ilość danych jednojęzycznych po stronie docelowej.', 'mn': 'Бид ихэвчлэн харилцааны холбоотой ертөнцөд амьдарч байгаа ч, өөр олон газар бидний амьдралын өдөр тутамд бидний амьдарч буй газрын холбоотой байдаг. Үүний үр дүнд хүмүүс дэлхийн өөр хэсэгт өөр зүйлсийн талаар ихэвчлэн ярьдаг. Энэ ажил дээр бид машины орчин нутгийн орчин үеийн нөлөөг судалж, үүнийг эх үүсвэр болон зорилготой хэлний орон нутгийг маш олон зөрчилдөөн өгдөг. Эхлээд бид эхлээд эх үүсвэрийн зорилготой зорилготой холбоотой ойлголтыг тооцоолж, метрийг тооцоолж, мөн орших үед эмператикийн баталгаа өгдөг. Бид эх үүсвэр зорилготой зорилготой холбоотой үйл ажиллагаанд машин орчуулах системийн сургалтын тухай бага нөөц хэлний сургалтыг хэрхэн нөлөөлдөг талаар эзэмшигтэй судалгаагаа Энэ нь буцаад орчуулалт маш их нөлөөлдөг ч, буцаад орчуулалт нь өөртөө суралцах болон зорилготой талын ганц хэлний мэдээллийг нэмэгдүүлж багасгаж болно.', 'ro': 'În timp ce trăim într-o lume din ce în ce mai interconectată, locuri diferite încă prezintă culturi uimitor de diferite și multe evenimente pe care le experimentăm în viața noastră de zi cu zi se referă doar la locul specific în care trăim. Ca urmare, oamenii vorbesc adesea despre lucruri diferite în diferite părți ale lumii. În această lucrare studiem efectul contextului local în traducerea automată și postulăm că acest lucru determină o mare neconcordanță a domeniilor limbii sursă și limbii țintă. Mai întâi formalizăm conceptul de neconcordanță a domeniului sursă-țintă, propunem o metrică pentru cuantificarea acestuia și furnizăm dovezi empirice pentru existența sa. Încheiem cu un studiu empiric asupra modului în care neconcordanța domeniului sursă-țintă afectează formarea sistemelor de traducere automată pe limbi cu resurse reduse. Deși acest lucru poate afecta grav traducerea înapoi, degradarea poate fi atenuată prin combinarea traducerii înapoi cu auto-instruirea și prin creșterea cantității de date monolingve din partea țintă.', 'si': 'අපි විශේෂයෙන් සම්බන්ධ ලෝකයෙන් ජීවත් වෙනවා නම්, වෙනස් ස්ථානයක් තාමත් වෙනස් සංස්කෘතිය සහ අපේ හැම දවසේ ජීවිතයේ අවස් ඉතින්, මිනිස්සු සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ලෝකයේ වෙනස් දේවල් ගැන කතා කරනවා. මේ වැඩේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ පරීක්ෂණයේ ස්ථානික සංවේදනයේ පරීක්ෂණය සහ පරීක්ෂණයේ පරීක්ෂණය සහ පරික්ෂණය කරන්නේ මේ අපි මුලින්ම මුළින්ම මුළින්ම මුළින්ම ලක්ෂණ දේමින්ගේ අවස්ථාවක් නැති වෙන්න, මෙට්\u200dරික් එකක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරන අපි අවස්ථාවක් විදියට පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා කොහොමද මුළු ලක්ෂණ පද්ධතියේ පද්ධතියේ පද්ධතියේ පද්ධතියේ අඩු මේක පිටිපස්සේ පස්සේ පරිවර්තනය කරන්න පුළුවන් වගේම, පස්සේ පස්සේ පරිවාර්තනය සමග ස්වාම්භාවිකය සමග සම්බන්ධ කරන්න සහ ඉලක', 'so': "While we live in an increasingly interconnected world, different places still exhibit strikingly different cultures and many events we experience in our every day life pertain only to the specific place we live in.  Sababtaas darteed dad marar badan waxyaabo kala duduwan ayaa ku hadla meelaha dunida kala duduwan. Shuqulkaas ayaannu ku baranaynaa saamaynta deegaanka ee ku jira turjumidda machine, waxan sababtaa in afka aad looga baahdo meelaha laga soo jeedo iyo afka kaalmeynta. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu horumarinnaa fikrada hoose-horaadka, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa metric si aan u qiyaasno, waxaana sameynaa caddeynta ay ku jiraan. Waxaannu ku dhamaynaynaa waxbarasho faa'iido ah oo ku saabsan jinsi habboonaanta degmooyinka ay u baahan tahay inay saameyso waxbarashada turjumidda machineedka oo ku qoran luuqadaha hoose ee macluumaadka. Inta ay taasu si adag ugu saameyn karto turjumista dib-u-turjumidda, waxaa la fududayn karaa in lagu soo wadayo tarjumaadda dib-u-isticmaalka iyo in lagu kordhiyo tirada aqoonta dhinaca noocyada ah.", 'sv': 'Medan vi lever i en alltmer sammanlänkad värld uppvisar olika platser fortfarande slående olika kulturer och många händelser vi upplever i vårt dagliga liv gäller bara den specifika platsen vi bor på. Som ett resultat pratar människor ofta om olika saker i olika delar av världen. I detta arbete studerar vi effekten av lokal kontext i maskinöversättning och postulerar att detta leder till att käll- och målspråkets domäner kraftigt missstämmer. Vi formaliserar först begreppet käll-måldomän missmatchning, föreslår ett mått för att kvantifiera det och ger empiriska bevis för dess existens. Vi avslutar med en empirisk studie av hur käll-måldomänmissmatchning påverkar utbildning av maskinöversättningssystem på lågresursspråk. Även om detta allvarligt kan påverka bakåtöversättning kan nedbrytningen lindras genom att kombinera bakåtöversättning med självträning och genom att öka mängden enspråkiga data på målsidan.', 'sr': 'Dok živimo u većem međupovezanom svijetu, različite mjesta i dalje pokazuju strogo različite kulture i mnoge događaje u našem svakodnevnom životu odnose se samo na određeno mesto u kojem živimo. Kao rezultat toga, ljudi često pričaju o različitim stvarima u različitim dijelovima svijeta. U ovom poslu proučavamo učinak lokalnog konteksta u prevodu mašine i objavljujemo da to uzrokuje domene izvora i ciljnog jezika da se veoma nesklade. Prvo formaliziramo koncept nepovladanja izvorskog domena, predložimo metriku da ga kvantificiramo i pružimo empiričke dokaze za njegovo postojanje. Zaključili smo s empiričkim studijom o tome kako se nesklade domena izvora koja utiče na obuku sustava prevoda mašina na jezike niskih resursa. Iako to može ozbiljno utjecati na prevod natrag, degradacija se može smanjiti kombinacijom prevoda natrag sa samoovježbanjem i povećanjem količine monojezičkih podataka sa ciljnim stranama.', 'ur': 'حالانکہ ہم بہت زیادہ متصلہ دنیا میں زندگی کرتے ہیں، مختلف جگہ اب تک مختلف فرق اور بہت سی اتفاق دکھاتے ہیں جنہیں ہم روزہ زندگی میں تجربہ کرتے ہیں، صرف وہی خاص جگہ ہے جس میں ہم زندگی کرتے ہیں۔ اس کے نتیجے میں لوگوں کو اغلب دنیا کے مختلف قسموں میں مختلف چیزوں کے بارے میں بات کرتے ہیں۔ ہم اس کام میں ماشین ترجمہ میں محلی کنٹنسٹ کے اثر پڑھتے ہیں اور پوسٹولیٹ کرتے ہیں کہ یہ سورج اور موجود زبان کے دامنوں کو بہت غلط بات بناتا ہے۔ ہم پہلی بار سورس-ٹاگل ڈومین کی نظریہ غلط مطابق کریں گے، اس کی تعداد کے لئے ایک متریک پیشنهاد کریں گے، اور اس کی موجودگی کے لئے مطابق نشانیاں پیشنهاد کریں گے۔ ہم نے ایک مضبوط تحقیق کے ساتھ فیصلہ کردیا ہے کہ سورسٹ-target ڈومین کیسے غلط مطابق ماشین ترجمہ سیسٹم کی تعلیم کم سورسٹ زبانوں پر تاثیر نہیں کرتا۔ حالانکہ یہ پیچھے ترجمہ پر سخت تأثیر دینے والی ہے، پچھلے ترجمہ کے ذریعے اپنے ترجمہ کے ساتھ کمزور کر دینے والی ہے اور موجود جانب کی ایک زبان کی اطلاعات کو زیادہ کر دینے والی ہے.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் அதிகமாக இணைக்கப்பட்ட உலகத்தில் வாழும் போது, வேறு இடங்கள் இன்னும் வெவ்வேறு கலாச்சாரங்களையும் மற்றும் நாங்கள் எங்கள் ஒவ்வொரு நாளு முடிவில், மக்கள் பெரும்பாலாகவே உலகின் வித்தியாசமான விஷயங்களைப் பற்றி பேசுகிறார்கள். இந்த வேலை மூலத்தின் இலக்கு களத்தின் பொருத்தத்தை முதலில் வடிவமைக்கிறோம், ஒரு மெட்ரிக் அதை அளவிடுவதற்கு பரிந்துரைக்கிறது, அதன் இருப்பத்திற் மூலம்- இலக்கு களத்தில் பொருத்தம் எவ்வாறு இயந்திர மொழிமாற்று அமைப்புகளை குறைந்த மூலத்தில் பயிற்சியை பாதிக்கும்  இது பின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பை கடுமையாக பாதிக்கலாம் போது, திரும்ப மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மொழிபெயர்ப்பை சேர்த்து கொண்டு குறைக்கலாம் மற்றும்', 'uz': "Biz ko'p bog'liq dunyoda yashayotganimiz paytda, har xil joylar har xil madaniyalar va har kuni hayotimizdagi ko'p narsalar faqat biz bor'layotgan xususiyatlar bilan ko'proq narsalarni ko'rsatadi. As a result, people often talk about different things in different parts of the world.  Ushbu vazifani biz kompyuterning tarjima tarjimasida lokal muktadha o'rganamiz va bu amalning manba va qanday tilning domenesi juda yoʻq qiladi. Biz birinchi manba-maqola domen'ning fikrini o'zgartirib chiqaramiz, uni aniqlash uchun metrikni talab qilamiz, va u mavjud bo'lgan imkoniyatlarni qo'shish mumkin. Biz qiziqarli o'qituvchimiz, manba-maqola domen muvaffaqiyatlarini qanday o'zgarishni qanday qo'yish mumkin. Mashining tarjima tizimlarini qisqarishga qo'yish mumkin. @ info: whatsthis", 'vi': 'Trong khi chúng ta sống trong một thế giới liên kết với nhau ngày càng nhiều, những nơi khác nhau vẫn có những nền văn hóa khác nhau, và nhiều sự kiện chúng ta trải qua hàng ngày chỉ liên quan đến nơi chúng ta sống. Kết quả là, người ta thường nói về những thứ khác nhau ở những nơi khác nhau trên thế giới. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu tác động của ngữ cảnh địa phương trong việc dịch chuyển máy và đặt ra rằng điều này gây ra các khu vực của ngôn ngữ nguồn và ngôn ngữ đích vô cùng không phù hợp. Chúng tôi bắt đầu thủ tục khái niệm không phù hợp với miền gốc, đề xuất một thước đo để đo số lượng nó, và cung cấp bằng chứng về sự tồn tại của nó. Chúng tôi kết thúc bằng một nghiên cứu Ô-liu nghiệm về phương pháp chưa phù hợp với lĩnh vực của nguồn tin, ảnh hưởng đến đào tạo dịch-biến-máy trên ngôn ngữ ít tài nguyên. Mặc dù việc này có thể ảnh hưởng nặng nề tới việc dịch lại, nhưng sự thoái hóa có thể được giảm bớt bằng việc kết hợp dịch lại với tự đào tạo và tăng lượng dữ liệu ngôn ngữ đích.', 'bg': 'Докато живеем в един все по-взаимосвързан свят, различните места все още проявяват поразително различни култури и много събития, които преживяваме в ежедневието си, се отнасят само до конкретното място, в което живеем. В резултат на това хората често говорят за различни неща в различни части на света. В тази работа изследваме ефекта на локалния контекст в машинния превод и постулираме, че това води до значително несъответствие между домейните на изходния и целевия език. Първо формализираме концепцията за несъответствие източник-цел домейн, предлагаме метричен метод за количествено определяне и предоставяме емпирични доказателства за съществуването му. Заключваме с емпирично проучване как несъответствието източник-целеви домейни влияе върху обучението на системи за машинен превод на езици с нисък ресурс. Въпреки че това може сериозно да повлияе на обратния превод, деградацията може да бъде облекчена чрез комбиниране на обратния превод със самообучение и чрез увеличаване на количеството едноезични данни от целевата страна.', 'hr': 'Dok živimo u većem međupovezanom svijetu, različite mjesta još uvijek pokazuju strogo različite kulture i mnoge događaje koje iskusimo u našem svakodnevnom životu odnose se samo na određeno mjesto u kojem živimo. Kao rezultat toga, ljudi često pričaju o različitim stvarima u različitim dijelovima svijeta. U ovom poslu proučavamo učinak lokalnog konteksta u prevodu strojeva i objavljujemo da to uzrokuje domene izvora i ciljnog jezika veoma nesklade. Prvo formaliziramo koncept nesklade sa ciljnim domenom, predlažemo metriku da ga kvantificiramo i pružimo empiričke dokaze za njegovo postojanje. Zaključili smo s empiričkim ispitivanjem o tome kako nesklade domena izvora-cilja utječe na obuku sustava prevoda strojeva na jezike niskih resursa. Iako to može ozbiljno utjecati na povratni prevod, degradacija se može smanjiti kombiniranjem povratnog prevoda sa samouvježbom i povećanjem količine monojezičkih podataka ciljne strane.', 'da': 'Mens vi lever i en stadig mere sammenhængende verden, udstiller forskellige steder stadig markant forskellige kulturer, og mange begivenheder, vi oplever i vores hverdag, vedrører kun det specifikke sted, vi bor i. Som følge heraf taler folk ofte om forskellige ting i forskellige dele af verden. I dette arbejde undersøger vi effekten af lokal kontekst i maskinoversættelse og postulerer, at dette medfører, at kilde- og målsprogets domæner i høj grad mismatch. Vi formaliserer først begrebet kilde-mål domæne mismatch, foreslår en metric til at kvantificere det, og giver empirisk dokumentation for dets eksistens. Vi afslutter med en empirisk undersøgelse af, hvordan kilde-mål domæne mismatch påvirker uddannelse af maskinoversættelsessystemer på lav ressource sprog. Selvom dette kan påvirke backoversættelse alvorligt, kan nedbrydningen lindres ved at kombinere backoversættelse med selvtræning og ved at øge mængden af ensprogede målside data.', 'nl': 'Hoewel we in een steeds meer met elkaar verbonden wereld leven, vertonen verschillende plaatsen nog steeds opvallend verschillende culturen en veel gebeurtenissen die we in ons dagelijks leven ervaren, hebben alleen betrekking op de specifieke plek waar we wonen. Hierdoor praten mensen vaak over verschillende dingen in verschillende delen van de wereld. In dit werk bestuderen we het effect van lokale context in machine translation en postuleren we dat hierdoor de domeinen van de bron- en doeltaal sterk mismatchen. We formaliseren eerst het concept van bron-doeldomein mismatch, stellen een metric voor om het te kwantificeren en leveren empirisch bewijs voor het bestaan ervan. We sluiten af met een empirische studie van hoe de bron-doeldomein mismatch invloed heeft op de training van machine translation systemen op low resource talen. Hoewel dit de terugvertaling ernstig kan beïnvloeden, kan de achteruitgang worden verlicht door back-translation te combineren met zelftraining en door de hoeveelheid monolinguale gegevens aan de doelzijde te verhogen.', 'de': 'Während wir in einer zunehmend vernetzten Welt leben, zeigen verschiedene Orte immer noch auffallend unterschiedliche Kulturen und viele Ereignisse, die wir im Alltag erleben, beziehen sich nur auf den spezifischen Ort, an dem wir leben. Infolgedessen reden Menschen oft über verschiedene Dinge in verschiedenen Teilen der Welt. In dieser Arbeit untersuchen wir den Einfluss des lokalen Kontextes in der maschinellen Übersetzung und postulieren, dass dadurch die Domänen der Ausgangs- und Zielsprache stark ineinandergreifen. Zunächst formalisieren wir das Konzept der Source-Target Domain Mismatch, schlagen eine Metrik vor, um es zu quantifizieren und liefern empirische Beweise für seine Existenz. Wir schließen mit einer empirischen Studie ab, wie sich Quell-Zieldomain-Mismatch auf das Training von maschinellen Übersetzungssystemen auf ressourcenarmen Sprachen auswirkt. Während dies die Rückübersetzung stark beeinträchtigen kann, kann die Degradation durch Kombination von Rückübersetzung mit Selbsttraining und Erhöhung der Menge an zielseitigen einsprachigen Daten gemildert werden.', 'id': 'Sementara kita hidup di dunia yang semakin terhubung, tempat-tempat yang berbeda masih menunjukkan budaya yang sangat berbeda dan banyak peristiwa yang kita alami dalam hidup kita setiap hari hanya berkaitan dengan tempat yang spesifik kita tinggal di. Sebagai hasilnya, orang sering berbicara tentang hal-hal yang berbeda di berbagai bagian dunia. In this work we study the effect of local context in machine translation and postulate that this causes the domains of the source and target language to greatly mismatch.  Kami pertama-tama formalisasi konsep dari ketidakcocokan domain sumber-target, melamar metrik untuk kuantifikasinya, dan menyediakan bukti empiris untuk keberadaannya. Kami menyelesaikan dengan sebuah studi empirik bagaimana ketidakcocokan domain sumber-target mempengaruhi pelatihan sistem terjemahan mesin pada bahasa sumber daya rendah. Meskipun hal ini dapat mempengaruhi secara berat terjemahan belakang, degradasi dapat dimusnahkan dengan menggabungkan terjemahan belakang dengan latihan sendiri dan dengan meningkatkan jumlah data monobahasa sisi sasaran.', 'fa': 'در حالی که ما در دنیای بسیار متصل\u200cتر زندگی می\u200cکنیم، جاهای متفاوتی هنوز فرهنگ\u200cهای متفاوتی و بسیاری از اتفاقات\u200cهایی را که در زندگی هر روز تجربه می\u200cکنیم، نشان می\u200cدهند که تنها به جای خاص در آن زندگی می\u200cکنیم. به نتیجه مردم اغلب درباره چیزهای مختلف در بخش های مختلف جهان صحبت می کنند. در این کار، ما اثر محیط محلی را در ترجمه ماشین مطالعه می کنیم و بعد از آن می گوییم که این باعث می شود که محیط منبع و زبان هدف بسیار غیرمساوی باشد. اولین بار مفهوم دامنه هدف منبع غیرمساوی را فرمودیم، یک متریک را پیشنهاد می کنیم تا آن را تعداد دهیم، و مدرک امپراتیک برای وجود آن را پیشنهاد می کنیم. ما با یک مطالعه امپراطوری درباره اینکه چگونه دامنه هدف منبع غیرمسابقه بر آموزش سیستم\u200cهای ترجمه ماشین در زبانهای منابع کم تأثیر می\u200cدهد، پایان می\u200cدهیم. در حالی که این ممکن است به شدت تأثیر ترجمه پشتی برگردد، تأثیر از تأثیر پشتی با آموزش خودش و با افزایش مقدار داده های یک زبان هدف می تواند کمتر شود.', 'sw': 'Wakati tunaishi katika dunia inayohusiana zaidi, maeneo mbalimbali bado yanaonyesha utamaduni tofauti na matukio mengi tunayoyapata katika maisha yetu kila siku yanahusiana na sehemu maalum tunayoishi. Matokeo yake, watu mara nyingi huzungumzia mambo tofauti katika sehemu mbalimbali za dunia. Katika kazi hii tunasoma madhara ya muktadha wa ndani katika tafsiri ya mashine na kutangaza kwamba hii inasababisha maeneo ya chanzo na lugha ya malengo yanayopingana sana. Kwanza tunaanzisha dhana ya kutokupana na malengo ya vyanzo, tunapendekeza mtiririki wa kuthibitisha, na kutoa ushahidi wa msisitizo wa kuwepo kwake. Tunaihitimisha kwa utafiti wa msisitizo wa jinsi ambavyo ukosefu wa makazi yanavyolengwa na vyanzo vinavyoathiri mafunzo ya mfumo wa kutafsiri mashine katika lugha ndogo ya rasilimali. While this may severely affect back-translation, the degradation can be alleviated by combining back-translation with self-training and by increasing the amount of target side monolingual data.', 'tr': 'Biziň dünýämizde köp baglaşykly ýaşaýarys bolsa, dürli ýerler hala dürli dürli kültürler we günümizde tecrübe etýän zatlarymyzyň diňe ýaşaýan ýerinde degişli. Soňunda adamlar dünýäde birnäçe zatlar barada gürleýärler. Bu işde biz maşynyň terjimelerinde ýerleşýän kontekstyň etkisini öwrenýär we bu sistemiň çeşme we maksady diliniň sahypalarynyň gaty bir eşleşmesini netijesini çykarýarys. Biz ilkinji başlangıç hedef domeniň meňzeşliklerini formalize, onu ölçülemek üçin metri teklif edip, varlığına empirik kanıtlar sağlayacağız. Biz başlangyç maksady domenyň maşynyň terjime sistemleriniň iň az ressurs dillerinde nähili etmäge täsirleýändigini boşadyk. Bu arka terjime etmäge gaty täsirli bolsa, yzyna terjime etmek bilen özüni okuw bilen birleşdirmekde we maksadyň barlag monodil maglumatlaryny artyp bilen azalyp biler.', 'ko': '비록 우리는 날로 서로 연결된 세계에서 생활하고 있지만 서로 다른 곳에서는 여전히 확연히 다른 문화를 보여주고 있다. 우리가 일상생활에서 겪은 많은 사건들은 우리가 생활하는 특정한 곳과만 관련이 있다.그래서 사람들은 항상 세계 각지에서 서로 다른 일을 이야기한다.이 작업에서 우리는 기계 번역에서 국부적인 언어 환경의 영향을 연구했고 이것은 원시 언어와 목표 언어의 영역이 심각하게 일치하지 않을 것이라고 가정했다.우리는 먼저 원-목표역이 일치하지 않는 개념을 형식화하고 양적 지표를 제시하며 그 존재에 경험적 증거를 제공했다.마지막으로 우리는 원-목표역의 불일치가 기계 번역 시스템이 저자원 언어에서의 훈련에 어떻게 영향을 미치는지에 대해 실증 연구를 실시했다.번역에 심각한 영향을 미칠 수 있지만 번역과 자기 훈련을 결합시키고 목표 단말기의 단어 데이터량을 늘려 이러한 퇴화를 완화시킬 수 있다.', 'af': "Alhoewel ons in 'n vergroeter interkonnekteerde wêreld lewe, vertoon verskillende plekke steeds streng verskillende kulture en baie gebeurtenis wat ons in ons elke dag lewe erfaring, slegs aan die spesifieke plek waarin ons lewe. As 'n resultaat praat mense dikwels oor verskillende dinge in verskillende dele van die wêreld. In hierdie werk ondersoek ons die effek van plaaslike konteks in masjien vertaling en postuleer dat dit die domeine van die bron en doel taal veroorsaak om baie mispaslik te doen. Ons formaliseer eerste die konsepte van bron-doel domein nie ooreenstemmende nie, voorstel 'n metrie om dit te kvantifiseer en verskaf empiriese bevestigheid vir sy eksistensie. Ons sluit met 'n empiriese studie van hoe bron-doel domein nie ooreenstemmende onderwerp van masjien vertalingsstelsels op lae hulpbron tale. Alhoewel dit dalk sterk kan effekteer terug-oersetting, kan die afbreiding alleviaer word deur terug-oersetting met self-oersetting te kombinerer en deur die hoeveelheid van die doel-kant monolinglike data te vermeerder.", 'sq': 'While we live in an increasingly interconnected world, different places still exhibit strikingly different cultures and many events we experience in our every day life pertain only to the specific place we live in.  Si rezultat, njerëzit shpesh flasin për gjëra të ndryshme në pjesë të ndryshme të botës. Në këtë punë ne studiojmë efektin e kontekstit lokal në përkthimin e makinave dhe postulojmë se kjo shkakton domenat e burimit dhe gjuhës objektive të mospërputhjes së madhe. Së pari formalizojmë konceptin e mospërputhjes burimi-objektiv në domeni, propozojmë një metrik për ta kuantifikuar atë, dhe furnizojmë prova empirike për ekzistencën e tij. Ne përfundojmë me një studim empirik se si mospërputhja burim-objektiv e domenit ndikon në trajnimin e sistemeve të përkthimit të makinave në gjuhët e ulëta të burimeve. Ndërsa kjo mund të ndikojë rëndë në përkthimin mbrapa, degradimi mund të lehtësohet duke kombinuar përkthimin mbrapa me vetëtrajnimin dhe duke rritur sasinë e të dhënave monogjuhësore të anës së objektivit.', 'hy': 'Մինչ մենք ապրում ենք ավելի ու ավելի փոխկապակցված աշխարհում, տարբեր վայրերը դեռևս ցույց են տալիս զարմանալիորեն տարբեր մշակույթներ և շատ իրադարձություններ, որոնք մենք զգում ենք մեր ամեն օր կյանքում, միայն կապված են մեր ապրող հատուկ վայրին: Արդյունքում մարդիկ հաճախ խոսում են տարբեր բաների մասին աշխարհի տարբեր մասերում: Այս աշխատանքում մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք տեղական կոնտեքստի ազդեցությունը մեքենայի թարգմանման մեջ և ենթադրում, որ սա հանգեցնում է աղբյուրի և նպատակային լեզու բնագավառների մեծ անհամապատասխանությանը: Սկզբում մենք ձևավորում ենք աղբյուր-նպատակային տիեզերքի անհամապատասխանության գաղափարը, առաջարկում ենք մետրիկ այն չափելու համար և ապահովում էմպրիկական ապացույցներ դրա գոյության համար: Մենք ավարտեցինք մի էմպիրիկ ուսումնասիրությամբ, թե ինչպես է աղբյուր-նպատակային բնագավառի անհամապատասխանությունը ազդում մեքենային թարգմանման համակարգերի ուսումնասիրությամբ ցածր ռեսուրսների լե Մինչդեռ սա կարող է լուրջ ազդել ետնաթարգմանման վրա, դեգրադացիան կարող է նվազեցնել հետնաթարգմանման համադրելով ինքնավարժման հետ և ավելացնելով նպատակային կողմի միալեզու տվյալների քանակը:', 'az': 'Biz daha çox bağlantılı dünyada yaşadığımız halda, fərqli yerlər hələ də çox fərqli kültürlər göstərir və hər gün yaşamımızda təcrübə edirik, yalnız bizim yaşadığımız məxluqat yerinə məxsus olur. Sonuçta insanlar dünyanın müxtəlif parçalarında fərqli şeylər haqqında danışırlar. Bu işdə biz maşın çevirilməsində yerli məlumatın etkisini təhsil edirik və bu mənbənin və məqsəd dilinin domenalarının çox uyğunlaşmasına sebep edir. Biz ilk dəfə mənbə-məqsəd domeinin müəyyən edilməsini formalizə edirik, onu kvantifikat etmək üçün metrik təklif edirik və onun varlığı üçün empirik dəlillər təklif edirik. Biz impirik məqsəd domeninin necə istifadə edilməsinin maşın çevirim sistemlərinin təhsil edilməsini düşük ressurs dillərində təhsil edir. Bu geri dönüşünü çox etkili olaraq, geri dönüşünü öz təhsil ilə birləşdirən və həmin təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil tərəfindən monodil verilənlərin dəyişikliklərini artıran olar.', 'bs': 'Dok živimo u većem međupovezanom svijetu, različite mjesta i dalje pokazuju strogo različite kulture i mnoge događaje koje iskusimo u našem svakodnevnom životu odnose se samo na određeno mjesto u kojem živimo. Kao rezultat toga, ljudi često pričaju o različitim stvarima u različitim dijelovima svijeta. U ovom poslu proučavamo učinak lokalnog konteksta u prevodu mašine i objavljujemo da to uzrokuje domene izvora i ciljnog jezika da se veoma nesklade. Prvo formaliziramo koncept nesklade sa ciljnim domenom, predlažemo metriku da ga kvantificiramo i pružimo empiričke dokaze za njegovo postojanje. Zaključili smo s empiričkim ispitivanjem o tome kako nesklade domena izvora-cilja utječe na obuku sustava prevođenja mašina na jezike niskih resursa. Iako to može ozbiljno utjecati na povratni prevod, degradacija se može olakšati kombinacijom povratnog prevoda sa samouvježbom i povećanjem količine monojezičkih podataka ciljne strane.', 'bn': 'যখন আমরা বৃদ্ধি পৃথিবীতে বাস করি, তখন বিভিন্ন স্থান এখনো বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন সংস্কৃতি এবং আমাদের প্রতিদিনের জীবনে আমরা অনেক ঘটনা দেখাচ্ছি যেখানে আমরা  এর ফলে পৃথিবীর বিভিন্ন এলাকায় মানুষ প্রায়শই আলাদা কথা বলে। এই কাজে আমরা মেশিন অনুবাদের মধ্যে স্থানীয় প্রতিক্রিয়ার প্রভাব গবেষণা করি এবং পোস্টালেট করি যে এটি উৎস এবং লক্ষ্য ভাষার ডোমেন আমরা প্রথমে উৎস-লক্ষ্যবস্তু ডোমেইনের ভুল মিল্যাসের ধারণা গঠন করি, এটি পরিমাপ করার জন্য একটি মেট্রিক প্রস্তাব করি এবং এর অস্তিত্বের জন্ আমরা শেষ করেছি কিভাবে উৎস-লক্ষ্য ডোমেইনের ভুল মিল কিভাবে কম সম্পদে মেশিন অনুবাদ সিস্টেমের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রভাবিত হয়েছে। While this may severely affect back-translation, the degradation can be alleviated by combining back-translation with self-training and by increasing the amount of target side monolingual data.', 'cs': 'Zatímco žijeme ve stále více propojeném světě, různá místa stále vykazují nápadně odlišné kultury a mnoho událostí, které zažíváme v našem každodenním životě, se týká pouze konkrétního místa, ve kterém žijeme. V důsledku toho lidé často mluví o různých věcech v různých částech světa. V této práci studujeme vliv lokálního kontextu v strojovém překladu a předpokládáme, že to způsobuje velkou nesouladu domén zdrojového a cílového jazyka. Nejprve formalizujeme koncept nesouladu zdrojové a cílové domény, navrhneme metriku pro její kvantifikaci a poskytneme empirické důkazy o její existenci. Závěrem je empirická studie toho, jak nesoulad zdrojové a cílové domény ovlivňuje školení strojových překladatelských systémů na jazycích s nízkými zdroji. I když to může vážně ovlivnit zpětný překlad, degradaci lze zmírnit kombinací zpětného překladu s vlastním tréninkem a zvýšením množství jednojjazyčných dat na cílové straně.', 'et': 'Kuigi me elame üha enam omavahel seotud maailmas, esinevad erinevad kohad ikka veel silmatorkavalt erinevaid kultuure ja paljud sündmused, mida me igapäevases elus kogeme, puudutavad ainult konkreetset kohta, kus me elame. Selle tulemusena räägivad inimesed sageli erinevatest asjadest erinevates maailma osades. Selles töös uurime kohaliku konteksti mõju masintõlkele ja oletame, et see põhjustab lähte- ja sihtkeele valdkondade suurt ebakõla. Esiteks vormistame allika-sihtdomeeni mittevastavuse kontseptsiooni, pakume välja mõõdiku selle kvantifitseerimiseks ja pakume empiirilisi tõendeid selle olemasolu kohta. Lõpetame empiirilise uuringuga, kuidas allika-sihtdomeeni ebakõla mõjutab masintõlkesüsteemide koolitust vähese ressursiga keeltes. Kuigi see võib tõsiselt mõjutada tagasitõlkimist, saab halvenemist leevendada, kombineerides tagasitõlkimise eneseõppega ja suurendades sihtpoole ühekeelsete andmete hulka.', 'ca': "While we live in an increasingly interconnected world, different places still exhibit strikingly different cultures and many events we experience in our every day life pertain only to the specific place we live in.  Com a resultat, la gent sovint parla de coses diferents en diferents parts del món. En aquesta feina estudiem l'efecte del contexte local en la traducció de màquines i postulem que això fa que els dominis de la font i el llenguatge d'objectiu siguin molt incompatibles. We first formalize the concept of source-target domain mismatch, propose a metric to quantify it, and provide empirical evidence for its existence.  Conclouem amb un estudi empíric de com el malajustament entre dominis de font i objectiu afecta l'entrenamient de sistemes de traducció màquina en llengües de baix recursos. Tot i que això pot afectar gravement la traducció posterior, la degradació es pot alleviar combinant la traducció posterior amb l'autoentrenament i augmentant la quantitat de dades monolingües del costat de l'objectiu.", 'fi': 'Vaikka el채mme yh채 enemm채n toisiinsa liittyv채ss채 maailmassa, eri paikoissa esiintyy edelleen silmiinpist채v채n erilaisia kulttuureja ja monet tapahtumat, joita koemme jokap채iv채isess채 el채m채ss채mme, liittyv채t vain tiettyyn paikkaan, jossa el채mme. T채m채n seurauksena ihmiset puhuvat usein eri asioista eri puolilla maailmaa. T채ss채 ty철ss채 tutkimme paikallisen kontekstin vaikutusta konek채채nt채miseen ja oletamme, ett채 t채m채 aiheuttaa l채hdekielen ja kohdekielen toimialueiden huomattavan ristiriidan. Ensin formalisoimme l채hde-kohdeverkkotunnuksen yhteensopimattomuuden k채sitteen, ehdotamme mittaria sen kvantifioimiseksi ja annamme empiirist채 n채ytt철채 sen olemassaolosta. P채채t채mme empiirisen tutkimuksen siit채, miten l채hde-kohdeverkkotunnuksen yhteensopimattomuus vaikuttaa konek채채nn철sj채rjestelmien koulutukseen v채h채resurssisilla kielill채. Vaikka t채m채 voi vaikuttaa vakavasti taaksek채채nt채miseen, heikkenemist채 voidaan lievitt채채 yhdist채m채ll채 taaksek채채nt채minen itseharjoitteluun ja lis채채m채ll채 kohdepuolen yksikielisten tietojen m채채r채채.', 'am': 'በተጨማሪም በተቃራኒ ዓለም እንኖራለን፣ ልዩ ቦታዎች ግን በተለየ ብዙዎችን ባሕሮች እና በዕለት ዕድሜችን በተለየን ስፍራ ብቻ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ስለዚህ ሰዎች ብዙ ጊዜ በዓለም ልዩ ክፍሎች ይናገራሉ፡፡ በዚህ ስራ ውስጥ የአገራዊ ግንኙነቱን በመmachine ትርጉም እና ይህ የመድረክ ክፍል እና የቋንቋ አካባቢ ቋንቋን እጅግ ተሳሳትተዋል፡፡ የመጀመሪያ የኩነቶች አካባቢ ዶሜን መፍጠር እናደርጋለን፡፡ ምንጭ-አካላዊ ዶሜን እንዴት እንደተቃወም የሜስክሮን ትርጉም ሲስተማርን በጥቂት resource ቋንቋዎች ላይ እንዲያስጨንቀው እንደተፈጸመ በማስተካከል እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ-ትርጓሜ ሲያስጨንቅ፣ በጀርባ-ትርጓሜ በራሱ ትርጓሜ በመቀላቀል እና በተቃውሞ የጎዳና ክፍል በሞሎንቋል ዳታ በመጨመር የሚችል ውርደት ይጎድላል፡፡', 'ha': "A lokacin da munã cikin wani duniya da ke ƙara haɗuwa da shi, sai wurãren dabam-dabam yana bayan kultur masu bashi da kuma masu yawa da muna haɗuwa da shi a cikin rãyuwarmu ko da yau, yana kamfata da duk wuri na ƙayyade. Tayya da shi, mutane da yawa sunã faɗa a kan abu mai sãɓãni na dabam-dabam a cikin duniya. Daga wannan aikin da Muke karanta aikin muhalli na lokaci cikin fassarar maɓalli kuma munã ƙayyade cẽwa, wannan yana saba'ar da maɓallin sourcen da harshen wanda aka ƙayyade shi mai girma. Kayyar da farkon, za'a danna zaɓen komai ɗin da aka yi amfani da shi ba, sai Mu ƙayyade wata metric don ya ƙayyade shi, kuma Mu sami bayanin komai da ke da shi. Tuna ƙara da wani littãfi na muhimmanci a kan jinsi da misalin komai-na-goa sun yi amfani da wa'anar fassarori na masu ƙaranci na fassarar ɗin misalin mashine. Alhãli kuwa wannan yana iya cũtar da sharri ga fassarar-bayan-bayani, sai a iya sauƙaƙara cewa, da kuma a ƙara ƙidãyar data na side-monolingal.", 'he': 'בזמן שאנחנו חיים בעולם שקשור יותר ויותר, מקומות שונים עדיין מראים תרבויות שונות ומדהימות רבות שאנחנו חווים בחיינו בכל יום קשורים רק למקום המיוחד שאנחנו חיים בו. כתוצאה מכך, אנשים מדברים לעתים קרובות על דברים שונים בחלקים שונים של העולם. בעבודה הזו אנו לומדים את ההשפעה של הקשר המקומי בתרגום מכונות והמשערים שזה גורם לתחומים של המקור ושפה המטרה להתאים מאוד. קודם אנו פורמלים את הרעיון של אי התאמה מקור-מטרה, מציעים מטריקה כדי לקוות אותו, ולספק ראיות אמפיריות לקיומו. אנחנו מסתיימים עם מחקר אמפירי על איך אי התאמה מקור-מטרה משפיעה על האימונים של מערכות התרגום מכונות על שפות משאבים נמוכות. למרות שזה יכול להשפיע ברצינות על התרגום האחורי, השפילה יכולה להיקל על ידי שילוב התרגום האחורי עם האימון עצמי ובידי הגבירה של כמות נתונים מונושפתיים לצד המטרה.', 'jv': 'Nanging awak dhéwé urip nêmên ning dunya luwih dumadhi, lan uwong-uwong sing ngesir kuwi tindakan tentang kanggo kalawartan sampek lan akèh sing ngenaé awak dhéwé ngerayakno ning awak dhéwé ora bisa urip kanggo awak dhéwé. Nggo njuk-njuk, wong-wong liyane sak babagan barang-barang sing uwong ning dunyo. Nang gawar iki, kita milih efek kanggo kelas kontèks lokal ning tarjamahan pangan lan mbukakipun oleh dumateng iki bakal kelas ain karo perbudhakan lan tarjamahan kanggo ngerasai. We first formalizate the design of source-goal domain mismatch, proposal a Metric to limity it, and present empircal data for her presence. We conce with an empircal read of the source-goal domain mismatch affect Learning of device translation sistems on small source language. Sampeyan ngono iki iso nggambar luwih-luwih tarjamahan, degradisi kapan iso nggawe ngubah tarjamahan kanggo ngubah-tarjamahan kanggo ngilangno sampeyan ngubah lan ijol-ijolan dino sing dikangaké sampeyan ingkang.', 'sk': 'Medtem ko živimo v vse bolj medsebojno povezanem svetu, različni kraji še vedno kažejo izjemno različne kulture in številni dogodki, ki jih doživljamo v našem vsakdanjem življenju, se nanašajo samo na določen kraj, v katerem živimo. Posledično ljudje pogosto govorijo o različnih stvareh v različnih delih sveta. V tem delu preučujemo učinek lokalnega konteksta v strojnem prevajanju in trdimo, da to povzroča močno neskladje domen izvornega in ciljnega jezika. Najprej formaliziramo koncept neskladja med izvorno in ciljno domeno, predlagamo merilo za kvantifikacijo in zagotovimo empirične dokaze o njegovem obstoju. Zaključimo z empirično študijo o tem, kako neskladje med izvorno in ciljno domeno vpliva na usposabljanje sistemov strojnega prevajanja na jezikih z nizkimi viri. Čeprav lahko to močno vpliva na nazaj prevajanje, je razgradnjo mogoče ublažiti s kombinacijo nazaj prevajanja s samousposabljanjem in s povečanjem količine enojezičnih podatkov na ciljni strani.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་དུས་མཐུན་དཀའ་ངལ་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་འཇིག་རྟེན་དུ་ཡོད་བཞིན་པའི་སྐབས་ཁྱད་པར་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་སྣང་མེད་དུ་འཇིག་རྟེན་དང་། དབྱངས་འབྲས་ན། མི་མང་རྒྱུན་དུ་འཛམ་གླིང་ཆ་མི་འདྲ་བའི་གནས་ཚུལ་སྐོར་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྩིས་འཁོར་ནས་རང་ཁུལ་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཁུལ We first formalize the concept of source-target domain mismatch, propose a metric to quantify it, and provide empirical evidence for its existence. ང་ཚོས་འབྱུང དེ་ནི་ཕར་ཚུལ་བསྒྱུར་བའི་སྐབས་ཡིག་ཆ།'}
{'en': 'Understanding Pre-Editing for Black-Box Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'فهم التحرير المسبق للترجمة الآلية العصبية لـ Black-Box', 'pt': 'Noções básicas sobre pré-edição para tradução automática neural de caixa preta', 'fr': 'Comprendre la préédition pour la traduction automatique neuronale en boîte noire', 'es': 'Comprensión de la preedición para la traducción automática neuronal de caja negra', 'ja': 'ブラックボックス神経機械翻訳のための事前編集の理解', 'zh': '知黑盒神经机器翻译预编', 'hi': 'ब्लैक-बॉक्स न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद के लिए पूर्व-संपादन को समझना', 'ru': 'Понимание предварительного редактирования для нейронного машинного перевода Black-Box', 'ga': 'Tuiscint ar Réamheagarthóireacht ar Aistriúchán Meaisín Neural Black-box', 'hu': 'A Black-Box Neural Machine Translation előszerkesztésének megértése', 'el': 'Κατανόηση της προεπεξεργασίας για τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση μαύρου κουτιού', 'it': 'Comprendere la pre-modifica per la traduzione automatica neurale Black-Box', 'lt': 'Supranti išankstinę Juodosios dėžutės nervinių mašinų vertimo redakciją', 'mk': 'Разбирам преуредување за превод на неврална машина во црна кутија', 'ms': 'Memahami Preedit untuk Terjemahan Mesin Neural Kotak Hitam', 'ml': 'കറുത്ത- ബോക്സിന്റെ നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള മുന്നില്\u200d എഡിറ്ററിങ്ങ് മനസ', 'ka': 'Black- Box ნეირალური მაქსინის გასაგულისხმებისთვის წინ რედაქტირება', 'mn': 'Black-Box мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө оруулалтын өмнө зохицуулалтыг ойлгох', 'mt': 'Understanding Pre-Editing for Black-Box Neural Machine Translation', 'kk': 'Қара- жақ нейралы машинаны аудару үшін алдын- ала өңдеу', 'pl': 'Zrozumienie edycji wstępnej dla neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego Black-Box', 'ro': 'Înțelegerea pre-editării pentru traducerea automată neurală a cutiei negre', 'sr': 'Razumevanje preuredbe za prevod neuroloških mašina u crnoj kutiji', 'si': 'Black- Box න්\u200dයුරල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය සඳහා මුලින් සංපාදනය තේරුම්ගන්න', 'so': 'Understanding Pre-Editing for Black-Box Neural Machine Translation', 'sv': 'Förstå förhandsredigering för Black-Box Neural Machine Translation', 'ta': 'கருப்புப் பெட்டியின் நெயுரல் இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்புக்கான முன் தொகுப்பு', 'ur': 'بلک-بوکس نیورال ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے پہلے سمجھ رہے ہیں', 'no': 'Forstår førehandtering for svart- boks neuralmaskinsomsetjing', 'vi': 'Hiểu trước sửa chữa máy thần kinh hộp đen', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Разбиране на предварително редактирането за неврален машинен превод в черна кутия', 'nl': 'Inzicht in pre-editing voor Black-Box Neural Machine Translation', 'hr': 'Razumijevanje preuredbe za prevod neuroloških strojeva u crnoj kutiji', 'da': 'Forståelse af forhåndsredigering til Black-Box Neural Machine Translation', 'ko': '블랙박스 신경 이해하기', 'de': 'Verstehen der Vorbearbeitung für Black-Box neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung', 'id': 'Mengerti Pre-Editing untuk Penerjemahan Mesin Neural Black-Box', 'fa': 'درک پیش ویرایش برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی سیاه جعبه', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Utafiti', 'tr': 'Kara-Box Nural Maşynyň Terjimesi üçin önden Editlemegini düşünmek', 'af': 'Verstaan voor- redigeering vir Swart- Box neurale masjien vertaling', 'sq': 'Përkuptimi i pararedaksionit për përkthimin e makinës nervore të kutisë së zezë', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Սև արկղի նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման նախախմբագրման հասկանալը', 'bn': 'ব্ল্যাক- বক্স নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য পূর্ব সম্পাদক', 'ca': 'Understanding Pre-Editing for Black-Box Neural Machine Translation', 'az': 'Siyah-Qutusu N칬ral Makin 칂톛rcl톛m톛si 칲칞칲n 칐n D칲zenleme', 'cs': 'Porozumění předběžným úpravám pro strojový překlad černé skříňky', 'bs': 'Razumijem preuredbu za prevod neuroloških strojeva u crnoj kutiji', 'et': 'Musta kasti neuroalse masintõlke eelredigeerimise mõistmine', 'fi': 'Black Box Neural Machine Translation -järjestelmän esikäsittelyn ymmärtäminen', 'jv': "Ngubah kang Ngubah Pri-Edit kanggo Terjamahan 'Neral-box'", 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'להבין את העורך הקדמי לתרגום מכונת נוירות בקופסה שחורה', 'sk': 'Razumevanje predhodnega urejanja za strojno prevajanje nevronov v črnih škatlah', 'bo': 'ནག་པོའི་སྔོན་ལྟའི་ཞུན་དག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡིན་ཆས་མེད་ལག་གི་ཚོར་བསྒྱུར་སྟངས'}
{'en': 'Pre-editing is the process of modifying the source text (ST) so that it can be translated by machine translation (MT) in a better quality. Despite the unpredictability of black-box neural MT (NMT), pre-editing has been deployed in various practical MT use cases. Although many studies have demonstrated the effectiveness of pre-editing methods for particular settings, thus far, a deep understanding of what pre-editing is and how it works for black-box NMT is lacking. To elicit such understanding, we extensively investigated human pre-editing practices. We first implemented a protocol to incrementally record the minimum edits for each ST and collected 6,652 instances of pre-editing across three translation directions, two MT systems, and four text domains. We then analysed the instances from three perspectives : the characteristics of the pre-edited ST, the diversity of pre-editing operations, and the impact of the pre-editing operations on NMT outputs. Our findings include the following : (1) enhancing the explicitness of the meaning of an ST and its syntactic structure is more important for obtaining better translations than making the ST shorter and simpler, and (2) although the impact of pre-editing on NMT is generally unpredictable, there are some tendencies of changes in the NMT outputs depending on the editing operation types.', 'es': 'La preedición es el proceso de modificar el texto de origen (ST) para que se pueda traducir mediante traducción automática (MT) con una mejor calidad. A pesar de la imprevisibilidad de la MT neuronal de caja negra (NMT), la preedición se ha desplegado en varios casos prácticos de uso de MT. Aunque muchos estudios han demostrado la eficacia de los métodos de preedición para entornos particulares, hasta ahora no se tiene una comprensión profunda de lo que es la preedición y cómo funciona para la NMT de caja negra. Para lograr tal comprensión, investigamos exhaustivamente las prácticas de preedición en humanos. Primero implementamos un protocolo para registrar de forma incremental las ediciones mínimas para cada ST y recolectamos 6.652 instancias de preedición en tres direcciones de traducción, dos sistemas de traducción automática y cuatro dominios de texto. A continuación, analizamos las instancias desde tres perspectivas: las características del ST preeditado, la diversidad de las operaciones de preedición y el impacto de las operaciones de preedición en los resultados de NMT. Nuestros hallazgos incluyen lo siguiente: (1) mejorar el significado explícito de una ST y su estructura sintáctica es más importante para obtener mejores traducciones que hacer que la ST sea más corta y simple, y (2) aunque el impacto de la preedición en la NMT es generalmente impredecible, hay algunas tendencias de cambios en las salidas de NMT en función de los tipos de operaciones de edición.', 'fr': "La pré-édition est le processus de modification du texte source (ST) afin qu'il puisse être traduit par traduction automatique (TA) avec une meilleure qualité. Malgré l'imprévisibilité de la magnétoscopie neuronale en boîte noire (NMT), la pré-édition a été déployée dans divers cas d'utilisation pratiques de la MT. Bien que de nombreuses études aient démontré l'efficacité des méthodes de pré-édition pour des environnements particuliers, jusqu'à présent, une compréhension approfondie de ce qu'est la pré-édition et de son fonctionnement pour la NMT en boîte noire fait défaut. Pour obtenir une telle compréhension, nous avons étudié de manière approfondie les pratiques de pré-édition humaines. Nous avons d'abord mis en place un protocole pour enregistrer progressivement les modifications minimales pour chaque ST et collecté 6 652 instances de pré-édition dans trois directions de traduction, deux systèmes de traduction automatique et quatre domaines de texte. Nous avons ensuite analysé les instances sous trois angles\xa0: les caractéristiques de la ST prééditée, la diversité des opérations de pré-édition et l'impact des opérations de pré-édition sur les sorties NMT. Nos résultats sont les suivants\xa0: (1) améliorer l'explicité de la signification d'un ST et de sa structure syntaxique est plus important pour obtenir de meilleures traductions que de rendre le ST plus court et plus simple, et (2) bien que l'impact de la pré-édition sur le NMT soit généralement imprévisible, il existe certaines tendances des modifications des sorties NMT en fonction des types d'opérations d'édition.", 'ar': 'التحرير المسبق هو عملية تعديل النص المصدر (ST) بحيث يمكن ترجمته عن طريق الترجمة الآلية (MT) بجودة أفضل. على الرغم من عدم القدرة على التنبؤ بـ MT العصبية للصندوق الأسود (NMT) ، فقد تم نشر التحرير المسبق في العديد من حالات استخدام الترجمة الآلية العملية. على الرغم من أن العديد من الدراسات قد أظهرت فعالية طرق التحرير المسبق لإعدادات معينة ، إلا أن الفهم العميق لماهية التحرير المسبق وكيف يعمل مع الصندوق الأسود NMT غير موجود. لاستنباط مثل هذا الفهم ، قمنا بالتحقيق على نطاق واسع في ممارسات التحرير المسبق البشرية. قمنا أولاً بتنفيذ بروتوكول للتسجيل التدريجي للحد الأدنى من التعديلات لكل ST وجمعنا 6،652 حالة من التحرير المسبق عبر ثلاثة اتجاهات ترجمة ونظامي الترجمة الآلية وأربعة مجالات نصية. ثم قمنا بتحليل الحالات من ثلاث وجهات نظر: خصائص ST المحرر مسبقًا ، وتنوع عمليات التحرير المسبق ، وتأثير عمليات التحرير المسبق على مخرجات NMT. تشمل النتائج التي توصلنا إليها ما يلي: (1) تحسين توضيح معنى النص المصدر وبنيته النحوية أكثر أهمية للحصول على ترجمات أفضل من جعل النص المصدر أقصر وأبسط ، و (2) على الرغم من تأثير التحرير المسبق على NMT لا يمكن التنبؤ به بشكل عام ، فهناك بعض الاتجاهات للتغييرات في نواتج NMT اعتمادًا على أنواع عمليات التحرير.', 'pt': 'A pré-edição é o processo de modificação do texto fonte (ST) para que possa ser traduzido por tradução automática (MT) com melhor qualidade. Apesar da imprevisibilidade da MT neural de caixa preta (NMT), a pré-edição foi implantada em vários casos práticos de uso da MT. Embora muitos estudos tenham demonstrado a eficácia dos métodos de pré-edição para configurações específicas, até agora, falta uma compreensão profunda do que é a pré-edição e como ela funciona para a NMT caixa-preta. Para obter tal compreensão, investigamos extensivamente as práticas humanas de pré-edição. Primeiro implementamos um protocolo para registrar incrementalmente as edições mínimas para cada ST e coletamos 6.652 instâncias de pré-edição em três direções de tradução, dois sistemas MT e quatro domínios de texto. Em seguida, analisamos as instâncias a partir de três perspectivas: as características do ST pré-editado, a diversidade das operações de pré-edição e o impacto das operações de pré-edição nas saídas NMT. Nossas descobertas incluem o seguinte: (1) aumentar a clareza do significado de um ST e sua estrutura sintática é mais importante para obter melhores traduções do que tornar o ST mais curto e simples, e (2) embora o impacto da pré-edição no NMT é geralmente imprevisível, existem algumas tendências de mudanças nas saídas NMT dependendo dos tipos de operação de edição.', 'ja': 'プリエディットとは、ソーステキスト（ ST ）を修正して、機械翻訳（ MT ）によってより良い品質で翻訳できるようにするプロセスです。 ブラックボックスニューラルMT （ NMT ）の予測不可能性にもかかわらず、事前編集は様々な実用的なMTユースケースに展開されています。 多くの研究では、特定の設定に対する事前編集方法の有効性が実証されていますが、これまでのところ、事前編集とは何か、およびそれがブラックボックスNMTにどのように機能するかについての深い理解が不足しています。 そのような理解を引き出すために、私たちは人間の編集前の慣行を広範囲に調査しました。 最初にSTごとの最小編集をインクリメンタルに記録するプロトコルを実装し、3つの翻訳方向、2つのMTシステム、4つのテキストドメインにわたって6,652件の事前編集を収集しました。 次に、事前編集されたSTの特性、事前編集操作の多様性、および事前編集操作がNMT出力に与える影響の3つの観点からインスタンスを分析した。 私たちの知見には以下が含まれます： （ 1 ） STの意味の明確性を高め、その構文構造はSTをより短く単純にするよりも、より良い翻訳を得るためにより重要です。（ 2 ） NMTへの事前編集の影響は一般的に予測できませんが、編集操作の種類に応じてNMT出力にいくつかの変化の傾向があります。', 'zh': '预编辑者,改源文本 (ST) ,可以机器翻译 (MT) 善译也。 虽黑盒神经机器翻译(NMT)有不可预测性,预辑已布实机器翻译用例中。 虽众论已证特定设之有效性,至于目前为止,阙于预辑,宜于黑盒NMT之深解。 为此解、博究人伦。 首行一协议以渐录 ST 最小编辑,并跨三译向、二 MT 系统及四文本域收集 6,652 个预辑实例。 然后析例于三角:预编辑ST之特徵,预辑操作之多样性及预编辑操之对NMT输。 臣等所见以下内容:(1)增ST及句法结构之义明确性于得善译短于ST,简而重之,及(2)虽预辑于NMT,常不可测,然据编辑操作之类,NMT输有变化之势。', 'hi': 'पूर्व-संपादन स्रोत पाठ (एसटी) को संशोधित करने की प्रक्रिया है ताकि इसे मशीन अनुवाद (एमटी) द्वारा बेहतर गुणवत्ता में अनुवादित किया जा सके। ब्लैक-बॉक्स न्यूरल एमटी (एनएमटी) की अप्रत्याशितता के बावजूद, पूर्व-संपादन को विभिन्न व्यावहारिक एमटी उपयोग मामलों में तैनात किया गया है। हालांकि कई अध्ययनों ने विशेष सेटिंग्स के लिए पूर्व-संपादन विधियों की प्रभावशीलता का प्रदर्शन किया है, इस प्रकार अब तक, पूर्व-संपादन क्या है और यह ब्लैक-बॉक्स एनएमटी के लिए कैसे काम करता है, इसकी गहरी समझ की कमी है। इस तरह की समझ को प्राप्त करने के लिए, हमने मानव पूर्व-संपादन प्रथाओं की बड़े पैमाने पर जांच की। हमने पहले प्रत्येक एसटी के लिए न्यूनतम संपादनों को वृद्धिशील रूप से रिकॉर्ड करने के लिए एक प्रोटोकॉल लागू किया और तीन अनुवाद दिशाओं, दो एमटी सिस्टम और चार टेक्स्ट डोमेन में पूर्व-संपादन के 6,652 उदाहरण एकत्र किए। फिर हमने तीन दृष्टिकोणों से उदाहरणों का विश्लेषण किया: पूर्व-संपादित एसटी की विशेषताएं, पूर्व-संपादन संचालन की विविधता, और एनएमटी आउटपुट पर पूर्व-संपादन संचालन का प्रभाव। हमारे निष्कर्षों में निम्नलिखित शामिल हैं: (1) एसटी के अर्थ की स्पष्टता को बढ़ाना और इसकी वाक्यात्मक संरचना एसटी को छोटा और सरल बनाने की तुलना में बेहतर अनुवाद प्राप्त करने के लिए अधिक महत्वपूर्ण है, और (2) हालांकि एनएमटी पर पूर्व-संपादन का प्रभाव आम तौर पर अप्रत्याशित है, संपादन ऑपरेशन प्रकारों के आधार पर एनएमटी आउटपुट में परिवर्तन की कुछ प्रवृत्तियां हैं।', 'ru': 'Предварительное редактирование - это процесс изменения исходного текста (ST) таким образом, чтобы его можно было перевести с помощью машинного перевода (MT) в лучшем качестве. Несмотря на непредсказуемость черного ящика нейронного MT (NMT), предварительное редактирование было развернуто в различных практических сценариях использования MT. Хотя многие исследования продемонстрировали эффективность методов предварительного редактирования для конкретных условий, до сих пор отсутствует глубокое понимание того, что такое предварительное редактирование и как оно работает для черного ящика NMT. Чтобы добиться такого понимания, мы тщательно изучили практику предварительного редактирования. Сначала мы внедрили протокол для постепенной записи минимальных правок для каждого ST и собрали 6652 экземпляра предварительного редактирования по трем направлениям перевода, двум системам MT и четырем текстовым доменам. Затем мы проанализировали примеры с трех точек зрения: характеристики предварительно отредактированного ST, разнообразие операций предварительного редактирования и влияние операций предварительного редактирования на результаты НБП. Наши выводы включают следующее: (1) повышение ясности значения ST и его синтаксической структуры более важно для получения лучшего перевода, чем сделать ST короче и проще, и (2) хотя влияние предварительного редактирования на НБП, как правило, непредсказуемо, есть некоторые тенденции изменений в выводах НБП в зависимости от типов операций редактирования.', 'ga': 'Is éard is réamheagarthóireacht ann ná an próiseas chun an téacs foinseach (ST) a mhodhnú ionas gur féidir é a aistriú trí mheaisín-aistriúchán (MT) ar chaighdeán níos fearr. In ainneoin dothuarthacht MT néar-bhosca dubh (NMT), tá réamheagarthóireacht curtha i bhfeidhm i gcásanna praiticiúla éagsúla a bhaineann le húsáid MT. Cé gur léirigh go leor staidéir éifeachtacht modhanna réamh-eagarthóireachta do shuíomhanna áirithe, go dtí seo, níl tuiscint dhomhain ar cad is réamheagarthóireacht ann agus conas a oibríonn sé do bhosca dubh NMT. Chun tuiscint den sórt sin a fháil, rinneamar imscrúdú cuimsitheach ar chleachtais réamheagarthóireachta daonna. Chuireamar prótacal i bhfeidhm ar dtús chun na híosmhéid athruithe a thaifeadadh go hincriminteach do gach ST agus bhailigh muid 6,652 chás réamheagarthóireachta thar thrí threoir aistriúcháin, dhá chóras MT, agus ceithre réimse téacs. Ansin rinneamar anailís ar na cásanna ó thrí pheirspictíocht: tréithe an ST réamh-eagarthóireachta, éagsúlacht na n-oibríochtaí réamheagarthóireachta, agus tionchar na n-oibríochtaí réamh-eagarthóireachta ar aschuir NMT. I measc ár dtorthaí tá: (1) soiléireacht bhrí ST a fheabhsú agus tá a struchtúr comhréire níos tábhachtaí chun aistriúcháin níos fearr a fháil ná an ST a dhéanamh níos giorra agus níos simplí, agus (2) cé go bhfuil tionchar na réamheagarthóireachta ar NMT go ginearálta nach féidir a thuar, tá roinnt treochtaí athruithe sna haschuir NMT ag brath ar na cineálacha oibríochta eagarthóireachta.', 'hu': 'Az előszerkesztés a forrásszöveg (ST) módosításának folyamata, hogy jobb minőségben lehessen fordítani gépi fordítással (MT). A fekete doboz neurális MT (NMT) kiszámíthatatlansága ellenére az előszerkesztést különböző gyakorlati MT használati esetekben alkalmazták. Bár számos tanulmány bizonyította az előszerkesztési módszerek hatékonyságát bizonyos beállítások esetében, eddig hiányzik az előszerkesztés, és hogyan működik a fekete dobozos NMT esetében. Az ilyen megértés elősegítése érdekében alaposan megvizsgáltuk az emberi előszerkesztési gyakorlatokat. Először bevezettünk egy protokollt, amely fokozatosan rögzítette az egyes ST-k minimális szerkesztéseit, és összegyűjtöttük a 6 652 előszerkesztési példányt három fordítási irányban, két MT rendszerben és négy szövegtartományban. Ezt követően három perspektívából elemeztük az eseteket: az előszerkesztett ST jellemzőit, az előszerkesztési műveletek sokféleségét, valamint az előszerkesztési műveletek NMT kimenetekre gyakorolt hatását. Megállapításaink közé tartozik: (1) az ST jelentésének és szintaktikus struktúrájának kifejezettségének fokozása fontosabb a jobb fordítások eléréséhez, mint az ST rövidebbé és egyszerűbbé tételéhez, és (2) bár az előszerkesztés hatása az NMT-re általában kiszámíthatatlan, vannak néhány tendenciák az NMT kimeneteiben a szerkesztési művelet típusától függően.', 'el': 'Η προεπεξεργασία είναι η διαδικασία τροποποίησης του αρχικού κειμένου (έτσι ώστε να μπορεί να μεταφραστεί με μηχανική μετάφραση (ΜΤ) σε καλύτερη ποιότητα. Παρά την απρόβλεπτη ικανότητα του νευρωνικού ΜΤ (ΜΤ), η προεπεξεργασία έχει αναπτυχθεί σε διάφορες πρακτικές περιπτώσεις χρήσης ΜΤ. Παρόλο που πολλές μελέτες έχουν αποδείξει την αποτελεσματικότητα των μεθόδων προεπεξεργασίας για συγκεκριμένες ρυθμίσεις, μέχρι στιγμής, λείπει μια βαθιά κατανόηση του τι είναι η προεπεξεργασία και πώς λειτουργεί για το μαύρο κουτί NMT. Για να διευκολυνθεί αυτή η κατανόηση, ερευνήσαμε εκτενώς ανθρώπινες πρακτικές προ-μοντάζ. Αρχικά εφαρμόσαμε ένα πρωτόκολλο για την σταδιακή καταγραφή των ελάχιστων επεξεργασιών για κάθε ΣΤ και συλλέξαμε 6,652 περιπτώσεις προεπεξεργασίας σε τρεις κατευθύνσεις μετάφρασης, δύο συστήματα ΜΤ και τέσσερις τομείς κειμένου. Στη συνέχεια αναλύσαμε τις περιπτώσεις από τρεις προοπτικές: τα χαρακτηριστικά του προ-επεξεργασμένου ST, την ποικιλομορφία των διαδικασιών προ-επεξεργασίας και τον αντίκτυπο των διαδικασιών προ-επεξεργασίας στις εξόδους NMT. Τα ευρήματά μας περιλαμβάνουν τα εξής: (1) η ενίσχυση της σαφήνειας της έννοιας ενός και της συντακτικής δομής του είναι πιο σημαντική για την απόκτηση καλύτερων μεταφράσεων από το να κάνει το ST συντομότερο και απλούστερο, και (2) παρόλο που ο αντίκτυπος της προεπεξεργασίας στο NMT είναι γενικά απρόβλεπτος, υπάρχουν ορισμένες τάσεις μεταβολών στις εξόδους NMT ανάλογα με τους τύπους εργασιών επεξεργασίας.', 'ka': 'პირველი რედაქტირება არის წიგნის ტექსტის რედაქტირების პროცესი, რადგან მაქსინური გაგრძელებით (MT) უკეთესი კაalitეში შეიძლება გაგრძელება. შავი კონტაქტის ნეიროლური MT (NMT) წარმოდგენელობას მაგრამ, წინ რედაქტირება განსხვავებულია განსხვავებული პრაქტიკური MT გამოყენების შემთხვევაში. თუმცა ბევრი სწავლებები განსაკუთრებულ პარამეტრებისთვის წინ რედაქტირების მეტოდენობის ეფექტიურობას გამოჩვენეთ, მიმდინარე, ძალიან გაგრძნობა რა არის წინ რედაქტირების და როგორ ჩვენ გავაკეთებდით ადამიანის წინ რედაქტირების პრაქტიკები. ჩვენ პირველი პროტოკოლას გავამყენეთ, რომელიც აკეთებულად მინუსმალური რედაქტირების მინუსმალური რედაქტირება ყოველ ST და 6,652 წინაწერების წინაწერების გარედაქტირება სამი წინაწერის, ორ შემდეგ ვიანალიზეთ სამი პერსპუტექტიდან მონაცემები: პრედაქტირებული ST-ის პერატიკები, პრედაქტირებული პერაციების განსხვავება, და პრედაქტირებული პერაციების განსხვავება NMT მონაცემების ჩვენი შესაძლებლობები აქვს:', 'it': "Il pre-editing è il processo di modifica del testo sorgente (ST) in modo che possa essere tradotto dalla traduzione automatica (MT) in una migliore qualità. Nonostante l'imprevedibilità della black-box neural MT (NMT), il pre-editing è stato implementato in vari casi pratici di utilizzo MT. Sebbene molti studi abbiano dimostrato l'efficacia dei metodi di pre-modifica per particolari impostazioni, finora manca una profonda comprensione di cosa sia la pre-modifica e di come funziona per NMT black-box. Per ottenere tale comprensione, abbiamo studiato approfonditamente le pratiche di pre-editing umane. Per prima cosa abbiamo implementato un protocollo per registrare incrementalmente le modifiche minime per ogni ST e abbiamo raccolto 6.652 istanze di pre-modifica in tre direzioni di traduzione, due sistemi MT e quattro domini di testo. Abbiamo quindi analizzato le istanze da tre prospettive: le caratteristiche della ST pre-editata, la diversità delle operazioni di pre-editing e l'impatto delle operazioni di pre-editing sulle uscite NMT. I nostri risultati includono i seguenti: (1) migliorare l'esplicità del significato di un ST e la sua struttura sintattica è più importante per ottenere traduzioni migliori che rendere l'ST più breve e semplice, e (2) sebbene l'impatto del pre-editing su NMT sia generalmente imprevedibile, ci sono alcune tendenze di cambiamenti negli output NMT a seconda dei tipi di operazioni di editing.", 'lt': 'Išankstinis redagavimas – tai išorinio teksto (ST) keitimo procesas, kad jį būtų galima geriau verti mašininiu vertimu (MT). Nepaisant juodos dėžutės neurologinio MT (NMT) nenumatymo, įvairiais praktiniais MT naudojimo atvejais buvo pradėta redaguoti iš anksto. Nors daugelis tyrimų parodė, kad tam tikrų nustatymų išankstinio redagavimo metodai yra veiksmingi, iki šiol trūksta išsamaus supratimo, kas yra išankstinis redagavimas ir kaip jis veikia juodojo langelio NMT atveju. Siekiant tokio supratimo, išsamiai ištyrėme žmonių rengimo praktiką. Pirmiausia įgyvendinome protokolą, kuriuo būtų palaipsniui įrašomi minimalūs kiekvieno ST redakcijos įrašai, ir surinkėme 6 652 išankstinio redakcijos atvejus trijose vertimo kryptimis, dviem MT sistemomis ir keturiose teksto srityse. Tada išanalizavome atvejus iš trijų perspektyvų: iš anksto redaguotos ST charakteristikas, išankstinio redagavimo operacijų įvairovę ir išankstinio redagavimo operacijų poveikį NMT rezultatams. Our findings include the following: (1) enhancing the explicitness of the meaning of an ST and its syntactic structure is more important for obtaining better translations than making the ST shorter and simpler, and (2) although the impact of pre-editing on NMT is generally unpredictable, there are some tendencies of changes in the NMT outputs depending on the editing operation types.', 'mk': 'Преуредувањето е процесот на модификација на изворниот текст (СТ) за да може да се преведе со машински превод (МТ) во подобар квалитет. И покрај непредвидливоста на црната кутија на невровниот МТ (НМТ), преуредувањето е распоредено во различни практични случаи на употреба на МТ. Иако многу студии ја покажаа ефикасноста на методите на преуредување за одредени поставувања, досега недостасува длабоко разбирање на она што е преуредување и како функционира за црна кутија НМТ. За да предизвикаме такво разбирање, ние екстремно истражувавме човекови практики за преуредување. Прво спроведовме протокол за постојано да ги запишеме минималните уредувања за секој СТ и собравме 6.652 случаи на преуредување во три насоки на превод, два МТ системи и четири текстови домени. Потоа ги анализиравме инстанциите од три перспективи: карактеристиките на преуредениот СТ, различноста на преуредувачките операции и влијанието на преуредувачките операции врз излезите на НМТ. Нашите откритија вклучуваат: 1) зголемувањето на експлицитноста на значењето на СТ и нејзината синтактичка структура е поважно за добивање подобри преводи отколку да го направи СТ пократок и поедноставен, и 2) иако влијанието на преуредувањето на НМТ е генерално непредвидливо, постојат некои тенденции на промени во излезите на НМТ во зависност од типовите на', 'ms': 'Preedit adalah proses mengubah suai teks sumber (ST) supaya ia boleh diterjemahkan oleh terjemahan mesin (MT) dalam kualiti yang lebih baik. Despite the unpredictability of black-box neural MT (NMT), pre-editing has been deployed in various practical MT use cases.  Walaupun banyak kajian telah menunjukkan kegunaan kaedah prasunting bagi tetapan tertentu, sejauh ini, kekurangan pemahaman dalam apa prasunting dan bagaimana ia berfungsi untuk NMT kotak hitam. Untuk menghasilkan pemahaman seperti itu, kami menyelidiki secara luas praktek pre-edisi manusia. Kami pertama-tama melaksanakan protokol untuk secara bertambah rekod edit minimum untuk setiap ST dan mengumpulkan 6,652 contoh pre-edit melalui tiga arah terjemahan, dua sistem MT, dan empat domain teks. Kemudian kami menganalisis kes-kes dari tiga perspektif: ciri-ciri ST yang disunting dahulu, pelbagai operasi penyunting dahulu, dan kesan operasi penyunting dahulu pada output NMT. Penemuan kami termasuk yang berikut: (1) meningkatkan keterangan makna ST dan struktur sintaktik ia lebih penting untuk mendapatkan terjemahan yang lebih baik daripada membuat ST lebih pendek dan mudah, dan (2) walaupun kesan pre-edisi pada NMT umumnya tidak dapat dijangka, terdapat beberapa kecenderungan perubahan dalam output NMT bergantung kepada jenis operasi edisi.', 'ml': 'മുമ്പ് ചിട്ടപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് സോര്\u200dസ് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് മാറ്റുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രക്രിയയാണ്. അതുകൊണ്ട് മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടു കറുത്ത-പെട്ടിയുടെ നെയുറല്\u200d MT (NMT) പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കാത്തതിന് ശേഷം, വ്യത്യസ്ത പ്രാകൃതിക എംടി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന കേസുകളില്\u200d  പ്രത്യേക സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് മുമ്പ് എഡിറ്ററിറ്റ് രീതികളുടെ പ്രവർത്തികമായി പല പഠനങ്ങളും കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കിലും, മുമ്പ് എഡിറ്റ ഇത്തരം ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടുകള്\u200d തെളിയിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിശാലമായി മനുഷ്യരുടെ മുമ്പ് എഡിറ്ററിങ്ങ് നടപടികള്\u200d അന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ആദ്യം ഒരു പ്രോട്ടോക്കോള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിച്ചു. എല്ലാ എസ്റ്റിന്റെയും ഏറ്റവും ചെറിയ എഡിറ്റുകള്\u200d എടുക്കാന്\u200d ആദ്യം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിച്ചു. മൂന് പിന്നീട് മൂന്നു ദൃഷ്ടികളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള സംഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിച്ചു: മുമ്പ് ചിട്ടപ്പെട്ട എസ്റ്റിന്റെ സ്വഭാവം, മുമ്പ് ചിട്ടപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന പ ഞങ്ങളുടെ കണ്ടുപിടികളില്\u200d പിന്നിലുള്ളത്: (1) എസ്റ്റിന്റെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നതും അതിന്റെ സിനിട്ടാക്കിക്കൊണ്ടുള്ള സ്റ്റിക്ക് ഘടനയുടെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം കൂടുതല്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നതും എസ്റ്റിന്റെ ചെറുതായ പരിഭാഷ', 'mt': 'L-edizzjoni minn qabel hija l-proċess li jimmodifika t-test tas-sors (ST) sabiex ikun jista’ jiġi tradott bit-traduzzjoni bil-magna (MT) f’kwalità a ħjar. Minkejja l-imprevedibbiltà ta’ MT newrali b’kaxxa sewda (NMT), il-pre-edizzjoni ġiet użata f’diversi każijiet prattiċi ta’ użu ta’ MT. Għalkemm ħafna studji wrew l-effikaċja tal-metodi ta’ pre-edizzjoni għal setturi partikolari, s’issa, hemm nuqqas ta’ fehim profond ta’ x’inhu l-pre-edizzjoni u kif taħdem għal NMT b’kaxxa sewda. Biex nipproduċu dan il-fehim, investigajna b’mod estensiv il-prattiki ta’ qabel l-edizzjoni tal-bniedem. L-ewwel implimentajna protokoll biex inkrementalment nirreġistraw l-editjar minimu għal kull ST u nġabru 6,652 każ ta’ pre-editjar fi tliet direzzjonijiet ta’ traduzzjoni, żewġ sistemi MT, u erba’ oqsma tat-test. Imbagħad analizzaw l-istanzi minn tliet perspettivi: il-karatteristiċi tal-ST pre-editat, id-diversità tal-operazzjonijiet ta’ pre-editar, u l-impatt tal-operazzjonijiet ta’ pre-editar fuq ir-riżultati tal-NMT. Is-sejbiet tagħna jinkludu dan li ġej: (1) it-titjib tal-espliċità tat-tifsira ta’ ST u l-istruttura sintattika tagħha hija aktar importanti biex jinkisbu traduzzjonijiet aħjar milli jsiru l-ST iqsar u aktar sempliċi, u (2) għalkemm l-impatt tal-pre-edizzjoni fuq l-NMT huwa ġeneralment imprevedibbli, hemm xi tendenzi ta’ bidliet fil-prodotti tal-NMT skont it-tipi ta’ operazzjonijiet tal-edizzjoni.', 'pl': 'Edycja wstępna to proces modyfikacji tekstu źródłowego (ST), tak aby mógł być tłumaczony przez tłumaczenie maszynowe (MT) w lepszej jakości. Pomimo nieprzewidywalności czarnej skrzynki neuronalnej MT (NMT), edycja wstępna została zastosowana w różnych praktycznych przypadkach zastosowania MT. Chociaż wiele badań wykazało skuteczność metod edycji wstępnej dla poszczególnych ustawień, do tej pory brakuje głębokiego zrozumienia czym jest edycja wstępna i jak działa w czarnej skrzynce NMT. Aby wydobyć takie zrozumienie, szeroko zbadaliśmy ludzkie praktyki pre-edycyjne. Najpierw wdrożyliśmy protokół do stopniowego rejestrowania minimalnych edycji dla każdego ST i zebraliśmy 6,652 instancje edycji wstępnej w trzech kierunkach tłumaczenia, dwa systemy MT i cztery domeny tekstowe. Następnie analizowaliśmy przypadki z trzech perspektyw: charakterystyki wstępnie edytowanego ST, różnorodność operacji wstępnej edycji oraz wpływ operacji wstępnej edycji na wyjścia NMT. Nasze ustalenia obejmują następujące: (1) zwiększenie wyraźności znaczenia ST i jego struktury składni jest ważniejsze dla uzyskania lepszych tłumaczeń niż skrócenie i prostsze oraz (2) chociaż wpływ wstępnej edycji na NMT jest ogólnie nieprzewidywalny, istnieją tendencje zmian w wyjściach NMT w zależności od typów operacji edycyjnych.', 'ro': 'Pre-editarea este procesul de modificare a textului sursă (ST) astfel încât să poată fi tradus prin traducere automată (MT) într-o calitate mai bună. În ciuda imprevizibilității MT neurale cu cutie neagră (NMT), pre-editarea a fost implementată în diferite cazuri practice de utilizare MT. Deși multe studii au demonstrat eficacitatea metodelor de pre-editare pentru anumite setări, până în prezent, o înțelegere profundă a ceea ce este pre-editarea și modul în care funcționează pentru NMT-ul negru lipsește. Pentru a obține o astfel de înțelegere, am investigat extensiv practicile umane de pre-editare. Am implementat mai întâi un protocol pentru a înregistra progresiv modificările minime pentru fiecare ST și am colectat 6.652 de instanțe de pre-editare în trei direcții de traducere, două sisteme MT și patru domenii text. Apoi am analizat instanțele din trei perspective: caracteristicile ST pre-editate, diversitatea operațiunilor de pre-editare și impactul operațiunilor de pre-editare asupra ieșirilor NMT. Rezultatele noastre includ următoarele: (1) îmbunătățirea explicității semnificației unui ST și structura sa sintactică este mai importantă pentru obținerea unor traduceri mai bune decât a face ST mai scurt și mai simplu, și (2) deși impactul pre-editării asupra NMT este în general imprevizibil, există unele tendințe de schimbare în ieșirile NMT în funcție de tipurile de operațiuni de editare.', 'kk': 'Алдын- ала өңдеу - көзінің мәтінін өзгерту процесі, сондықтан машинаны аудару (MT) арқылы жақсы сапатта аударылады. Қара көздеген невралдық MT (NMT) белгілікті болмаса, алдын- өңдеу әртүрлі MT пайдалану кездерінде орындалды. Көптеген зерттеулер өзгертілген параметрлердің алдын- өзгерту әдістерін көрсету мүмкіндігін көрсетеді, сонымен қазір, алдын- өзгерту қандай жұмыс істеу және NMT қара жазуының қалай жұ Бұл түсінікті таңдау үшін, біз адамдардың алдын- өңдеу әрекеттерін көптеген зерттедік. Біз біріншіден әрбір ST үшін төменгі редакторды жазып, үш аудармалы бағыттарды, екі MT жүйесі және төрт мәтін домендерінде алдын- ала өзгерту үшін 6 652 инстанцияларды көтеріп келдік. Содан кейін біз үш бақыттан жағдайларды анализировадық: алдын- өзгертілген ST қасиеттері, алдын- өзгерту операциялардың қасиеттері, NMT шығысына алдын- өзгерту операциялардың әсері. Біздің табуларымыз келесі: 1) ST мен оның синтактикалық құрылымының мазмұнын түсіндіру ST қысқартылығын және қарапайым түсіндіру үшін, және (2) NMT бағдарламасының алдындағы өзгертулердің нәтижесі көбірек болмайды, өзгерту операциялық түрлеріне тәуелді NMT шығысының к', 'sr': 'Pre redikcije je proces izmjene izvornog teksta (ST) tako da se može prevesti sa prevodom mašine (MT) u boljoj kvaliteti. Uprkos nepredvidljivosti neuralnog MT (NMT) crne kutije, prededitanje je utvrđeno u različitim praktičnim slučajevima upotrebe MT-a. Iako su mnoge studije pokazale učinkovitost metoda prededitanja za određene postavke, do sada, duboko razumijevanje o tome šta je prededitanje i kako radi za crno-kutiju NMT nedostaje. Da bi izbrisali takvo razumevanje, prošireno smo istražili ljudske prakse pre redikcije. Prvo smo proveli protokol za povećanje snimanja minimalnih editora svakog ST-a i prikupili 6.652 instanca pre-editiranja u tri smjera o prevodu, dva MT sistema i četiri tekstna domena. Tada smo analizirali instance iz tri perspektive: karakteristike prededitiranog ST-a, raznolikost prededitiranih operacija i utjecaj prededitiranih operacija na ishod NMT-a. Naši nalazi uključuju sljedeće: 1) povećanje objašnjenja značenja ST i njegove sintaktičke strukture je važnije za dobivanje boljih prevoda nego što bi ST kraći i jednostavniji, i (2) iako je uticaj prededitacije na NMT uopšte nepredvidljiv, postoje neke tendencije promjena u rezultatima NMT-a ovisno o vrstama editacije.', 'si': 'මුලින් සංපාදනය තමයි මුලින් පාළුව (ST) වෙනස් කරන්න ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාව, එතකොට ඒක හොඳ ස්වභාවිතයෙන් පණිවාදය (MT Black- box neural MT (NMT) ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති නමුත්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විවිධ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් MT භාවිතා වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන විශේෂ සැකසුම් සඳහා විශේෂ සැකසුම් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගොඩක් අධ්\u200dයානය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරකාශ කරලා තියෙනවා නම අපි මිනිස්සුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරාර්ථනාවක් පරීක්ෂණය කළා. අපි මුලින්ම ප්\u200dරෝටෝකෝල් එකක් ප්\u200dරවෘත්ති කරලා හැම ST වෙනුවෙන් අඩුම සංපාදනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරොටෝකෝල් 6,652 ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් සංමාණය ක අපි පස්සේ විශ්ලේෂණය කරලා තුනක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් තියෙනවා: මුලින් සංපාදනය කරපු ST ගේ විශේෂතාවය, මුලින් සංපාදනය කරපු ව්\u200dයාප්\u200d අපේ හොයාගැනීමේ පස්සේ තියෙන්නේ: (1) ST ගේ අදහසේ ප්\u200dරසිද්ධතාවක් සහ එයාගේ සංවිධානයක් වඩා වැදගත් වෙන්නේ ST කොටස් සහ සරලයි, සහ (2) NMT ගේ ප්\u200dරසිද්ධතාවක් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරසිද්ධානය නොප්\u200dර', 'mn': 'Өмнөх өөрчлөлт нь эх үүсвэрийн текст (ST) өөрчлөлтийн процесс юм. Иймээс машины орчуулалт (MT) нь илүү сайн сайн чанартай орчуулах боломжтой. Хар хайрцаг тархины мэдрэлийн MT (NMT) байдлын төгсгөл байдлыг хэзээ ч өмнө засварлах нь олон практикийн MT хэрэглээний тухай хэрэглэгдсэн. Ихэнх судалгаанууд тодорхой тодорхойлолтын өмнө зохион байгуулах аргын үр дүнг харуулсан ч, одоо хэзээ ч өмнө зохион байгуулах болон хар хайрцаг NMT-д хэрхэн ажилладаг талаар гүн ухаан үзүүлсэн. Ийм ойлголтыг зогсоохын тулд бид хүн төрөлхтний өмнө засах үйл ажиллагааг судалсан. Бид эхлээд ST бүрт хамгийн бага редактуудыг нэмэгдүүлэх протокол хийсэн ба 3 дахь орчуулалт, 2 MT систем, 4 текст сүлжээ аль хэвлэх 6,652 тохиолдолыг цуглуулсан. Дараа нь бид гурван харагдаж байгаа жишээг шинжилгээ хийсэн: өмнө зохион байгуулагдсан ST, өмнө зохион байгуулагдсан үйл ажиллагааны өөрчлөлт, NMT үр дүн дээр өмнө зохион байгуулах үйл ажиллагааны нөлөө. Бидний олж мэдсэн зүйлс нь: (1) ST болон үүний синтактикийн утгыг илүү тодорхойлох нь ST богино болон хялбар болгоход илүү чухал юм. Харин (2) NMT дээр аль хэдийн зохицуулах нөлөө нь ерөнхийдөө таамаглахгүй ч, NMT-ын үр дүнд өөрчлөлтийн төвшин байдаг.', 'so': 'Wax-editi-ka-horaadku waa sameynta beddelinta qoraalka asalka (ST) si loo turjumo turjumista machine (MT) si aad u fiican u taqaanid. Inkastoo aan la sii sheegi karin neural neural MT (NMT), waxaa lagu soo bandhigay pre-editing xaaladaha isticmaalka MT ee kala duduwan. In kastoo waxbarasho badan ay muujiyaan effektada ku saabsan qaababka hagitaanka ee gaarka ah, hadda ka dib ayaa aad u baahan kara waxyaabaha ku saabsan sawirida horaadka iyo siduu u shaqeeyo qoriga madowga oo NMT u baahan yahay. Si aan u barto waxgarashadaas, waxaynu si aad ah u baaraynaa hababka dadka ee wax-beddelaya. We first implemented a protocol to incrementally record the minimum edits for each ST and collected 6,652 instances of pre-editing across three translation directions, two MT systems, and four text domains.  Markaas waxaynu baaraynay dhacdooyinka saddexda dhinac: xariijiyada ST, hawlaha hagaajiga hore iyo saamaynta waxyaabaha ku saabsan waxyaabaha ku saabsan qoritaanka NMT. Faahwadeena waxaa ku jira:', 'sv': 'Förbedigering är processen att ändra källtexten (ST) så att den kan översättas med maskinöversättning (MT) i en bättre kvalitet. Trots oförutsägbarheten hos black-box neural MT (NMT) har förhandsredigering implementerats i olika praktiska MT-användningsfall. Även om många studier har påvisat effektiviteten av pre-redigeringsmetoder för vissa inställningar saknas en djup förståelse för vad pre-redigering är och hur det fungerar för black-box NMT. För att skapa en sådan förståelse undersökte vi i stor utsträckning mänskliga pre-redigeringsmetoder. Vi implementerade först ett protokoll för att stegvis registrera minsta redigering för varje ST och samlade in 6 652 instanser av förhandsredigering över tre översättningsriktningar, två MT-system och fyra textdomäner. Därefter analyserade vi instanserna ur tre perspektiv: egenskaperna hos den förbehandlade ST, mångfalden av förbehandlade operationer och effekten av förbehandlade operationer på NMT-utgångar. Våra resultat inkluderar följande: (1) att förbättra expliciteten i innebörden av en ST och dess syntaktiska struktur är viktigare för att få bättre översättningar än att göra ST kortare och enklare, och (2) även om effekten av förhandsredigering på NMT generellt är oförutsägbar, finns det vissa tendenser till förändringar i NMT-utgångarna beroende på redigeringstyperna.', 'no': 'Førredigering er prosessen for å endra kjeldeteksten (ST) slik at det kan verta omsett av maskinsomsetjing (MT) i ein betre kvalitet. Til tross ikkje foretrekking av svart boks neurale MT (NMT), er forredigering utført i ulike praktiske MT-bruk-tilfeller. Selv om mange studier har demonstrert effektiviteten av førehandsvisingsmetoder for spesielle innstillingar, så langt er ein dyp forståelse av kva førehandsvising er og korleis det fungerer for svart boks NMT manglar. For å forstå slike forståelse, har vi utvidet menneske førehandsvising. Vi implementerte først eit protokoll for å oppretta minimale redigeringar for kvar ST og samla 6,652 instansar for forredigering over tre omsetjingsmeldingar, to MT- systemer og fire tekstdomene. Vi analysere derfor instansane frå tre perspektiv: karakteristika av forredigerte ST, diversiteten av forredigeringsoperasjonar og effekten av forredigeringsoperasjonar på NMT-utdata. Finningane våra inneheld følgjande: (1) å forbetra uttrykket på betydninga av ST og syntaktiske strukturen er meir viktig for å få bedre omsetjingar enn å gjera ST kortere og enklare, og (2) selv om effekten av forredigering på NMT er vanlegvis uverkjengeleg, er det nokre tendenser for endringar i NMT-utgåva avhengig av redigeringstypane.', 'ta': 'மூல உரையை மாற்றும் முன்தொகு Despite the unpredictability of black-box neural MT (NMT), pre-editing has been deployed in various practical MT use cases.  பல படிப்பாடுகள் குறிப்பிட்ட அமைப்புகளுக்கு முன் திருத்தும் முறைமைகளின் விளைவை காண்பித்துள்ளார்கள் என்றாலும், முன் திருத்துதல் என்ன இவ்வாறு புரிந்து கொள்ள, நாம் விரிவாக மனித த தொகுப்பு முன் செயல்களை ஆய்வு செய்தோம். முதலில் நாம் ஒவ்வொரு ST க்கும் குறைந்தபட்ச திருத்தங்களை பதிவு செய்ய ஒரு நெறிமுறையை முதலில் செயல்படுத்தி மூன்று மொழிபெயர்ப்பு திருத்தல் நிகழ நாம் மூன்று காட்சிகளில் இருந்து நிகழ்வுகளை ஆய்வு செய்தோம்: முன் தொகுக்கப்பட்ட ST தன்மைகள், முன் தொகுப்பு செயல்களின் வித்தியாசம், முன் தொகுப்பு செ எங்கள் கண்டுபிடிப்புகளில் கீழே உள்ளது: (1) ST வெளிப்படையாக அதிகப்படுத்தும் அதன் ஒத்திசைவான அமைப்புகள் ST சிறிய மொழிப்பெயர்ப்புகளை செய்வதை விட சிறந்த மொழிபெயர்ப்புகளை பெற முக்கியமானது, மற்றும் (2) என்எம்டி முன்', 'ur': 'پہلے سمجھنے کا پروسس سورس ٹیکسٹ (ST) بدلنے کے لئے ہے تاکہ اس کو ماشین ترجمہ (MT) کے ذریعہ بہتر کیفیت میں ترجمہ کر سکے۔ سیاه باکس نیورال مٹی (NMT) کی غیر پردیدگی کے باوجود، مختلف قابل مٹی استعمال کے کیسوں میں پیش ایڈیٹ کیے گئے ہیں. اگرچہ بہت سی تحقیقات نے مخصوص تنظیمات کے لئے پہلے سمجھنے کے طریقے کا اثرات دکھایا ہے، یہاں تک، پہلے سمجھنے کے بارے میں بہت عمیق سمجھنے والی ہے اور اس کا کیسا عمل NMT کے لئے کم ہے۔ اس طرح کی سمجھنے کے لئے ہم نے انسان کے پہلے سمجھنے کے مطابق اضافہ کیا۔ ہم نے پہلی بار ایک پروٹوکل کو اضافہ کرنے کے لئے ہر ST کے لئے نیم ویڈیٹوں کا ریکورد کرنا اور تین ترجمہ کی طرف سے پہلے ویڈیٹ کرنے کے لئے 6,652 نمونے جمع کئے، دو MT سیستم اور چار ٹیکسٹ ڈومین. اس کے بعد ہم نے تین نظریوں سے مثالیں تحقیق کی: پہلے سمجھی ہوئی ST کی خصوصیات، پہلے سمجھنے کی عملیات کی مختلف فرق، اور NMT اجلاموں پر پہلے سمجھنے کی عملیات کا اثر. ہمارے نتیجے نیچے لکھتے ہیں: (1) ST اور اس کی سینٹکتیک ساختاری کا مطلب کھول کھول کر زیادہ اچھا ہے اس سے بہتر ترجمہ حاصل کرنے کے لئے ST چھٹا اور آسان بنانے کے لئے اور (2) اگرچہ NMT پر پیش ویڈیش کا اثر عموماً غیر پیش بینی ہوتا ہے، NMT نتیجے میں کچھ تغییروں کی تغییرات موجود ہیں جو ویڈیش کے طریقوں پر dependent ہیں.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Qoraq qutisi neural MT (NMT) tarkibini oldin tahrirlash Ko'pchilik tahrirlash usullarning foydalanishini ko'rsatadi, ammo shunday paytda, oldin tahrirlash nima bo'lganligini va bu qor qutisining NMT uchun qanday ishlayotganligini juda qiyin tushunadi. Buni tushunish uchun, biz inson tahrirlash pre-tahrirlash amallarini juda ko'p qilamiz. Biz har birinchi ST uchun eng kichik tahrirlarni yozib olish uchun protokolni boshlagan va 3 tarjima qilish uchun 6,652 xususiyatlarni uchta tarjima qilish uchun bir xil tarjimasi, ikki MT tizimi va to'rt matn domenalarini olib tashladik. Keyin biz uchta shakldan misollarni analyzdik: birinchi tahrirlangan ST'ning xususiyatlarini, pre-tahrirlash amallarining turi, va NMT tashkilotlaridan oldin tahrirlash amallarining effekti. Bizning murojaatlarimiz quyidagi: (1) ST ma'nosini oshirish va uning syntactik structuriyasi ST ta'sirida yaxshi tarjimalarni olish juda muhim, va (2) agar NMT'dan oldin tahrirlash natijasi umuman kutilmagan boʻlmasligi bo'lsa, tahrirlash turlariga bir necha tarjimalar mavjud.", 'vi': 'Trước sửa chữa là tiến trình sửa đổi văn bản gốc (ST) để nó có thể được dịch qua máy dịch (MTV) với chất lượng tốt hơn. Mặc cho sự khó đoán của kênh thần kinh nằm trong hộp đen (NMB), việc hiệu chỉnh trước đã được triển khai trong nhiều trường hợp thực dụng MTV. Mặc dù nhiều nghiên cứu đã chứng minh hiệu quả của các phương pháp sửa trước cho các thiết lập đặc biệt, cho tới nay vẫn chưa có hiểu sâu về hiệu quả trước và cách nó hoạt động cho NMT hộp đen. Để tạo ra sự hiểu biết, chúng tôi đã nghiên cứu kỹ thuật sửa chữa con người. Đầu tiên chúng tôi thực hiện một giao thức ghi lại các biên bản tối thiểu cho mỗi ST và thu thập 6,652 các trường hợp soạn thảo trước nhau ba hướng dịch, hai hệ thống MTV, và bốn miền văn bản. Sau đó chúng tôi phân tích các trường hợp từ ba góc nhìn: các đặc điểm của lớp ST được sửa trước, đa dạng các thao tác bổ sung trước, và tác động của thao tác bổ sung NMT. Những kết quả của chúng tôi gồm: 1) tăng rõ ý nghĩa của một lớp ST và cấu trúc cú pháp của nó quan trọng hơn là cung cấp dịch tốt hơn là làm lớp ST ngắn hơn và đơn giản hơn, và (2) mặc dù tác động của việc sửa trước công nghệ NMT là không thể lường trước, nhưng có một số xu hướng thay đổi trong kết xuất NMB phụ thuộc vào các kiểu sửa chữa thao tác.', 'bg': 'Предварителната редакция е процес на модифициране на изходния текст (СТ), така че да може да бъде преведен чрез машинен превод (МТ) в по-добро качество. Въпреки непредсказуемостта на черната кутия неврален МТ (НМТ), предварителното редактиране е внедрено в различни практически случаи на използване на МТ. Въпреки че много проучвания демонстрират ефективността на методите за предварително редактиране за определени настройки, досега липсва задълбочено разбиране за това какво е предварителното редактиране и как работи за черната кутия НМТ. За да съберем такова разбиране, ние обстойно изследвахме човешките практики за предварителна редакция. Първо внедрихме протокол за постепенно записване на минималните редакции за всеки и събрахме 652 случая на предварително редактиране в три посоки на превод, две системи и четири текстови домейна. След това анализирахме инстанциите от три гледни точки: характеристиките на предварително редактирания СТ, разнообразието от операциите по предварително редактиране и въздействието на операциите по предварително редактиране върху изходите на НМТ. Нашите открития включват следното: (1) повишаването на яснотата на значението на СТ и синтактичната му структура е по-важно за получаването на по-добри преводи, отколкото да направи СТ по-кратък и опростен, и (2) въпреки че въздействието на предварителното редактиране върху НМТ като цяло е непредсказуемо, има някои тенденции за промени в изхода в НМТ в зависимост от видовете операции по редактиране.', 'da': 'Forhåndsredigering er processen med at ændre kildeteksten (ST), så den kan oversættes ved maskinoversættelse (MT) i en bedre kvalitet. På trods af uforudsigeligheden af black-box neural MT (NMT), er pre-redigering blevet implementeret i forskellige praktiske MT brugscases. Selvom mange undersøgelser har vist effektiviteten af pre-redigeringsmetoder til bestemte indstillinger, mangler indtil videre en dyb forståelse af, hvad pre-redigering er, og hvordan det virker for black-box NMT. For at opnå en sådan forståelse undersøgte vi grundigt menneskelige præredigeringspraksis. Vi implementerede først en protokol til trinvis registrering af minimumsredigeringer for hver ST og indsamlede 6.652 forekomster af forhåndsredigering på tværs af tre oversættelsesretninger, to MT-systemer og fire tekstdomæner. Derefter analyserede vi forekomsterne ud fra tre perspektiver: karakteristika ved den forudredigerede ST, mangfoldigheden af forudredigeringsoperationer og effekten af forudredigeringsoperationerne på NMT output. Vores resultater omfatter følgende: (1) at forbedre udtrykkeligheden af betydningen af en ST og dens syntaktiske struktur er vigtigere for at opnå bedre oversættelser end at gøre ST kortere og enklere, og (2) selvom effekten af pre-redigering på NMT generelt er uforudsigelig, er der nogle tendenser til ændringer i NMT output afhængigt af redigeringsoperationstyperne.', 'nl': 'Pre-editing is het proces van het wijzigen van de brontekst (ST) zodat deze kan worden vertaald door machine translation (MT) in een betere kwaliteit. Ondanks de onvoorspelbaarheid van black-box neural MT (NMT), is pre-editing ingezet in verschillende praktische MT use cases. Hoewel veel studies de effectiviteit van pre-editing methoden voor bepaalde settings hebben aangetoond, ontbreekt tot nu toe een diep begrip van wat pre-editing is en hoe het werkt voor black-box NMT. Om dit inzicht te krijgen, hebben we uitvoerig menselijke pre-editing praktijken onderzocht. We hebben eerst een protocol geïmplementeerd om de minimale bewerkingen voor elke ST incrementel vast te leggen en verzamelden 6,652 exemplaren van voorbewerking in drie vertaalrichtingen, twee MT-systemen en vier tekstdomeinen. Vervolgens analyseerden we de instanties vanuit drie perspectieven: de kenmerken van de vooraf bewerkte ST, de diversiteit van pre-editing operaties en de impact van de pre-editing operaties op NMT outputs. Onze bevindingen omvatten het volgende: (1) het verbeteren van de duidelijkheid van de betekenis van een ST en de syntactische structuur ervan is belangrijker voor het verkrijgen van betere vertalingen dan het korter en eenvoudiger maken van de ST, en (2) hoewel de impact van pre-editing op NMT over het algemeen onvoorspelbaar is, zijn er enkele tendensen van veranderingen in de NMT-outputs afhankelijk van de bewerkingstypen.', 'hr': 'Prije editiranja je proces izmjene teksta izvora (ST) tako da se može prevesti prema prevodu strojeva (MT) u boljoj kvaliteti. Unatoč nepredvidljivosti neuralnog MT-a u crnoj kutiji (NMT), u različitim praktičnim slučajevima primjene MT-a prije redikcije je utvrđena. Iako su mnoge ispitivanja pokazale učinkovitost metoda predredikcije za određene nastave, do sada, duboko razumijevanje o tome što je predredikcija i kako radi za crne kutije NMT nedostaje. Da bi se izvukli takvo razumijevanje, prošireno smo istražili ljudske prakse predreditacije. Prvo smo proveli protokol za povećanje snimanja minimalnih redakcija svakog ST-a i prikupili 6.652 slučajeva predredikcije u tri smjera prevoda, dva MT sustava i četiri tekstna domena. Tada smo analizirali slučajeve iz tri perspektive: karakteristike prededitiranog ST-a, raznolikost prededitiranih operacija i utjecaj prededitiranih operacija na ishod NMT-a. Naši nalazi uključuju sljedeće: 1) poboljšanje objašnjenja značenja ST i njegove sintaktičke strukture je važnije za dobivanje boljih prevoda nego što učiniti ST kratko i jednostavniji, i (2) iako je učinak predredikcije na NMT općenito nepredvidljiv, postoje neke tendencije promjene u rezultatima NMT-a ovisno o vrstama redakcije.', 'id': 'Pre-edit adalah proses untuk mengubah teks sumber (ST) sehingga dapat diterjemahkan oleh terjemahan mesin (MT) dalam kualitas yang lebih baik. Meskipun tidak terduga MT saraf kotak hitam (NMT), presedisi telah digunakan dalam berbagai kasus penggunaan MT praktis. Meskipun banyak penelitian telah menunjukkan efektivitas metode pre-edisi untuk pengaturan tertentu, sejauh ini, pemahaman dalam tentang apa pre-edisi dan bagaimana ia bekerja untuk NMT kotak hitam tidak ada. Untuk menghasilkan pemahaman seperti itu, kami menyelidiki secara ekstensif praktek pre-edisi manusia. Kami pertama-tama mengimplementasikan protokol untuk incremental merekam edit minimal untuk setiap ST dan mengumpulkan 6.652 kasus pre-edit melalui tiga arah terjemahan, dua sistem MT, dan empat domain teks. Kemudian kami menganalisis kejadian dari tiga perspektif: karakteristik ST yang telah disunting sebelumnya, kebanyakan operasi yang telah disunting sebelumnya, dan dampak operasi yang telah disunting sebelumnya pada hasil NMT. Penemuan kami termasuk yang berikut: (1) meningkatkan eksplicitas arti ST dan struktur sintaksnya lebih penting untuk mendapatkan terjemahan yang lebih baik daripada membuat ST lebih pendek dan sederhana, dan (2) meskipun dampak predimensi pada NMT umumnya tidak terduga, ada beberapa kecenderungan perubahan dalam output NMT tergantung pada tipe operasi editasi.', 'de': 'Pre-Editing ist der Prozess, den Quelltext (ST) so zu modifizieren, dass er durch maschinelle Übersetzung (MT) in einer besseren Qualität übersetzt werden kann. Trotz der Unvorhersehbarkeit von Black-Box Neural MT (NMT) wurde Pre-Editing in verschiedenen praktischen MT-Anwendungsfällen eingesetzt. Obwohl viele Studien die Wirksamkeit von Pre-Editing-Methoden für bestimmte Settings gezeigt haben, fehlt bisher ein tiefes Verständnis dafür, was Pre-Editing ist und wie es für Black-Box-NMT funktioniert. Um dieses Verständnis zu wecken, untersuchten wir ausführlich menschliche Pre-Editing-Praktiken. Zunächst implementierten wir ein Protokoll zur schrittweisen Aufzeichnung der minimalen Bearbeitungen für jeden ST und sammelten 6,652 Instanzen der Vorbearbeitung über drei Übersetzungsrichtungen, zwei MÜ-Systeme und vier Textdomänen. Anschließend analysierten wir die Instanzen aus drei Perspektiven: die Eigenschaften des vorbearbeiteten ST, die Vielfalt der Vorbearbeitungsoperationen und die Auswirkungen der Vorbearbeitungsoperationen auf NMT-Outputs. Unsere Ergebnisse umfassen die folgenden: (1) Die Verbesserung der Deutlichkeit der Bedeutung eines ST und seiner syntaktischen Struktur ist wichtiger, um bessere Übersetzungen zu erhalten, als die Verkürzung und Vereinfachung des ST, und (2) obwohl die Auswirkungen der Vorbearbeitung auf NMT im Allgemeinen unvorhersehbar sind, gibt es einige Tendenzen zu Veränderungen in den NMT-Ausgaben in Abhängigkeit von den Bearbeitungsoperationen.', 'ko': '사전 편집은 기계 번역(MT)을 통해 더 좋은 품질로 번역할 수 있도록 원본 텍스트(ST)를 수정하는 과정이다.블랙박스 신경기계번역(NMT)은 예측할 수 없는 수준이지만, 각종 실제 기계번역 용례에 사전 편집이 배치돼 있다.비록 많은 연구에서 사전 편집 방법이 특정 환경에서의 유효성을 증명했지만 지금까지 사전 편집이 무엇인지, 그리고 그것이 블랙박스 NMT에 어떻게 적용되는지에 대해 깊은 이해가 부족하다.이러한 이해를 얻기 위해 우리는 인류의 사전 편집 실천을 광범위하게 조사했다.우리는 먼저 각 ST의 최소 편집을 증량 방식으로 기록하고 6652개의 세 가지 번역 방향, 두 개의 기계 번역 시스템과 네 개의 텍스트 영역에 걸쳐 미리 편집한 실례를 수집했다.그런 다음 사전 편집 ST의 특성, 사전 편집 작업의 다양성, 사전 편집 작업이 NMT 출력에 미치는 영향 등 세 가지 측면에서 인스턴스를 분석했습니다.우리의 연구 결과는 (1) ST의 의미를 강화하고 문법 구조의 명확성을 강화하는 것이 ST를 단축하고 간소화하는 것보다 더 좋은 번역을 얻는 데 더 중요하다. (2) 미리 편집이 NMT에 미치는 영향은 예측할 수 없지만 편집 조작 유형에 따라 NMT 출력에 약간의 변화 추세가 있다.', 'sw': 'Mhariri wa awali ni mchakato wa kubadilisha maandishi ya chanzo (ST) ili kutafsiriwa na tafsiri ya mashine (MT) kwa kiwango bora. Pamoja na uwezekano wa utabiri wa MT wa neura za kisasa nyeusi (NMT), uhariri wa awali umetumiwa katika matukio mbalimbali ya kihalisi ya MT. Ingawa tafiti nyingi zimeonyesha ufanisi wa njia za kabla ya kuhariri kwa ajili ya mazingira maalum, mpaka sasa, kuelewa kina ufahamu wa kile kinachotokea kabla ya kuhariri na jinsi inavyofanya kazi kwa ajili ya kituo cha NMT kinachokosa. Ili kuelezea uelewa wa namna hiyo, tunachunguza kwa kiasi kikubwa vitendo vya kuhariri binadamu. Kwanza tulitekeleza protoko ya kuandika uhariri wa chini kwa kila ST na tukakusanya matukio 6,652 ya kuhariri kwa maelekezo mitatu ya tafsiri, mifumo miwili ya MT, na maeneo minne ya maandishi. We then analysed the instances from three perspectives: the characteristics of the pre-edited ST, the diversity of pre-editing operations, and the impact of the pre-editing operations on NMT outputs.  Matokeo yetu yanajumuisha: (1) kuongeza wazi ya maana ya ST na muundo wake wa ushirikiano ni muhimu zaidi kwa kupata tafsiri bora kuliko kufanya tafsiri fupi na rahisi zaidi ya ST, na (2) ingawa madhara ya uhariri wa awali kwenye NMT kwa ujumla hauwezi kutabiri, kuna aina fulani ya mabadiliko ya matokeo ya NMT yanategemea aina ya operesheni ya kuhariri.', 'fa': 'پیش از ویرایش فرآیند تغییر متن منبع (ST) است تا بتواند توسط ترجمه ماشین (MT) در کیفیت بهتر ترجمه شود. با وجود غیرقابل پیش بینی از MT عصبی جعبه سیاه (NMT) پیش ویرایش در پرونده\u200cهای استفاده از MT عملی مختلف استفاده شده است. اگرچه بسیاری از مطالعه\u200cها فعالیت روش پیش\u200cویرایش برای تنظیمات خاص را نشان داده\u200cاند، تا هنگام، درک عمیقی از پیش\u200cویرایش چیست و چگونه برای NMT سیاه جعبه کار می\u200cکند. برای تحقیق این درک، ما عملیات پیش ویرایش انسان را تحقیق کردیم. اولین بار یک پروتکل برای ثبت کردن اندازه\u200cهای کمینه برای هر ST و 6.652 نمونه\u200cهای پیش\u200cویرایش در سه راه ترجمه، دو سیستم MT و چهار دامنه\u200cهای متن را جمع کردیم. بعدش ما داستانها را از سه نگاه تحلیل کردیم: ویژگی های ST پیش ویرایش شده، مختلف عملیات پیش ویرایش و تاثیر عملیات پیش ویرایش بر نتیجه NMT. نتیجه\u200cهای ما شامل این است: ۱) افزایش توضیح معنی ST و ساختاری syntactic آن برای پیدا کردن ترجمه\u200cهای بهتر از ترجمه\u200cهای ST کوتاه\u200cتر و ساده\u200cتر است، و (۲) با وجود اینکه تاثیر پیش\u200cویرایش روی NMT معمولاً غیر پیش\u200cبینی است، برخی تغییرات در نتیجه\u200cهای NMT بستگی به نوع عملیات ویرایش وجود دارد.', 'tr': "Öňki editlemek - çeşme metini (ST) üýtgetmek üçin ol maşynyň terjime (MT) görä gowy kalitede terjime edilsin. Kara-guty näyral MT (NMT) nyýerasynyň öňünden öň-düzenlemesi ýöne, birnäçe praktik MT ulanylaryň durumlarda guruldy. Köp öwrenme häzirki düzenlemek üçin ön düzenlemek täsirini kanıtlapdyr, häzirçe, ön düzenlemek üçin nähili ýok bolýandygyny we NMT-iň gara gutynda nähili işleýändigini kanıtlapdyr. Böyle düşünjeleri çykarmak üçin, adamlaryň öňünden düzenlemek praktikalaryny golaý bardyk. Biz ilkinji gezek her ST üçin iň kiçi editleri kaydetmek üçin bir protokol implementedik we üç terjime yönünde 3 terjime yönünde, iki MT sistemi we dört metin sahypalaryny topladyk. Sonra üç görnöşinden örän çykyşlary çözdik: Ön düzenli ST'iň karakterleri, öň düzenlemek emelleriniň näsazlyklarynyň, we NMT netijesinde öň düzenlemek emelleriniň täsirini çözdik. Biziň tapylyklarymyz daşarydaky: (1) ST we syntaktik strukturyň aňsatlygyny azaltmak ST gysga we ýeňil terjimeleri almak üçin has möhüm, we (2) NMT'iň ön düzenlemesiniň täsiri döwürlenemeýän bolsa-da, düzenleme taryşlaryna görä NMT netijesinde birnäçe üýtgewler bar.", 'sq': 'Preeditimi është procesi i modifikimit të tekstit burimor (ST) në mënyrë që të përkthehet nga përkthimi i makinës (MT) në një cilësi më të mirë. Megjithë papreditueshmërinë e kutisë së zezë të MT (NMT), parareditimi është vendosur në raste të ndryshme praktike të përdorimit të MT. Megjithëse shumë studime kanë demonstruar efektshmërinë e metodave të pararedaksionit për rregullime të veçanta, deri tani mungon një kuptim i thellë i asaj që është pararedaksioni dhe se si funksionon për NMT kutinë e zezë. To elicit such understanding, we extensively investigated human pre-editing practices.  Së pari zbatuam një protokoll për të regjistruar në mënyrë graduale modifikimet minimale për secilin ST dhe mbledhëm 6,652 raste pararedigimi nëpër tre drejtime përkthimi, dy sisteme MT dhe katër fusha teksti. Pastaj analizuam rastet nga tre perspektiva: karakteristikat e ST të pararedaktuar, diversitetin e operacioneve pararedaktuese dhe ndikimin e operacioneve pararedaktuese në rezultatet e NMT. Zbulimet tona përfshijnë të ardhshmen: (1) përmirësimi i shpjeguesisë së kuptimit të një ST dhe struktura sintaktike e saj është më e rëndësishme për të marrë përkthime më të mira sesa për të bërë ST më të shkurtër dhe më të thjeshtë, dhe (2) megjithëse ndikimi i pararedaksionit në NMT është përgjithësisht i papreditueshëm, ka disa prirje të ndryshimeve në rezultatet e NMT në varësi të tipeve të operacionit të redaksionit.', 'hy': 'Առաջին խմբագրությունը աղբյուր տեքստի (ՍՏ) փոխման գործընթացն է, որպեսզի այն կարելի է ավելի լավ որակով թարգմանել մեքենայի (ՄԹ) միջոցով: Չնայած սև արկղի նյարդային MT-ի (NMT) անկանխատեսելիությանը, նախախմբագրությունը կիրառվել է տարբեր պրակտիկ MT-ի օգտագործման դեպքերում: Չնայած շատ ուսումնասիրություններ ցույց են տվել, որ որոշակի կարգավորումների համար նախախմբագրման մեթոդների արդյունավետությունը, մինչ այժմ խորը հասկացություն չունի նախախմբագրման մասին և թե ինչպես է այն աշխատում NMT-ի սևամորթ արկղի համար: To elicit such understanding, we extensively investigated human pre-editing practices.  Առաջին անգամ մենք իրականացրեցինք պրոտոկոլ, որպեսզի գրանցենք յուրաքանչյուր ՍՏ-ի համար ամենամեծ խմբագրությունները և հավաքեցինք 6.652 նախախմբագրման օրինակ երեք հաղորդակցման ուղղություններում, երկու MT համակարգ և չորս տեքստ Այնուհետև մենք վերլուծեցինք երեք տեսանկյունից օրինակները. նախախմբագրված ՍՏ-ի առանձնահատկությունները, նախախմբագրված գործողությունների բազմազանությունը և նախախմբագրված գործողությունների ազդեցությունը NMT-ի արդյունքների վրա: Մեր հայտնաբերությունները ներառում են հետևյալը: 1) բարձրացնել ՍՏ-ի իմաստի բացատրությունը և դրա սինտակտիկ կառուցվածքը ավելի կարևոր է ավելի լավ թարգմանություններ ստանալու համար, քան ՍՏ-ը ավելի կարճ և պարզ դարձնելու համար, և 2) չնայած, որ նախախմբագրման ազդեցությունը NMT-ի վրա ընդհանուր առմամբ անկանխատեսելի է, NMT-ի արտա', 'af': "Vorige redigeering is die proses van verander die bron teks (ST) sodat dit kan vertaal word deur masjien vertaling (MT) in 'n beter kwaliteit. Terwyl die onvoorskoubaarheid van swart- boks neurale MT (NMT) is, is voor- redigeering in verskillende praktiese MT gebruik gevalle uitgestel. Alhoewel baie studie het die effektiviteit van voor- redigeering metodes vir spesifieke instellings bevestig, tot toe 'n diep verstanding van wat voor- redigeering is en hoe dit werk vir swart- box NMT is ontbreek. Om sodanige verstanding te verlos, het ons uitbreidig menslike voor redigeering praksies ondersoek. Ons het eerste 'n protokol geïmplementeer om die minimale redigeerders vir elke ST te opneem en 6,652 instansies van voor- redigeering oor drie vertalingsdireksies, twee MT stelsels en vier teks domeine versamel. Ons het dan die voorbeelde van drie perspektiewe analiseer: die karakteristieke van die voor-redigeerde ST, die diversiteit van voor-redigeering operasies en die effek van die voor-redigeering operasies op NMT uitvoers. Ons gevinde inkluit die volgende: (1) die uitbreiding van die betekening van 'n ST en sy sintaktiske struktuur is meer belangrik vir die verkry van beter vertalinge as die ST kort en eenvoudiger maak, en (2) alhoewel die effek van voor redigering op NMT generelik onvoorskoubaar is, is daar sommige tendensies van veranderinge in die NMT uitvoerdes afhanklik van die redigeringsoperasie tipes.", 'am': 'Pre-edit is the process of modifying the source text (ST) so it can be translated by machine translation (MT) in a better quality. ከጥቁር-box neural MT (NMT) ምንም እንኳ የማይቀበል ቢሆንም በፊት-editing has been deployed in various practical MT uses cases. ብዙ ትምህርት ምንም እንኳ የፊተኛውን አስተካክል ማቀናጃ ማድረጊያውን ለማድረግ ጥልቅ አስተዋልተዋል፡፡ እንደዚህ ያለውን ማስተዋል ለማግኘት የሰውን አስቀድሞ ማቀናጃ ሥራ በብዛት እንመረምርዋለን፡፡ አስቀድመን ለሁሉም የST ማስታወቂያውን ማረፊያ የሚያስፈልገውን ፕሮጀክት እና በሦስት ትርጉም መንገዶች፣ ሁለት MT ስርዓቶች እና አራት የጽሑፍ ድምፅ ሰብሰብን፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ የምስልቶችን ከሦስት ዓይነት አስተያየን: አስቀድሞ የተካፈሉት ST፣ የቀድሞ ማቀናጃ ምርጫዎች፣ የቅድመ-አስተካክል ምርጫዎች በNMT ውጤቶች ላይ ውጤት የሚደረገውን አስተያየን፡፡ ፍለጋዎቻችን የሚከተሉትን:(1) የST እና የSyntactic ሥርዓት ማብራራትን ማድረግ እና ST አነስተኛ እና ቀላል ማግኘት የሚሻል ትርጓሜዎችን ለማግኘት ያስፈልጋል፡፡', 'az': 'Əvvəl düzenleme mənbə metini (ST) dəyişdirmək üçün maşın çeviri (MT) ilə daha xeyirli keyfiyyətlə çevirilə bilər. Kara qutusu nöral MT (NMT) təhlükəsizlik etməyə rağmen, əvvəl düzenleme müxtəlif praktik MT istifadə məqsədilə yayıldı. Birçox təhsil müəyyən edilməsi üçün əvvəl düzenleme metodlarının etkinliğini göstərsə də, bu qədər, əvvəlcə düzenleme nədir və NMT qara qutusu üçün necə çalışır? Bütün anlaşılmaları çəkmək üçün biz insan əvvəlcə düzenleme praksisini çox təşkil etdik. Biz ilk dəfə hər ST üçün minimal editlərini çox yazmaq üçün bir protokol təyin etdik və üç çeviri yönəltmək üçün 6.652 örneğini, iki MT sistemi və dörd metin domeini topladıq. Sonra üç nəzərdən gələnlər analiz etdik: əvvəlcə editli ST-nin xüsusiyyətlərini, əvvəlcə editli işlərin müxtəlifliyini və NMT çıxışların əvvəl editli işlərin etkisini. Bizim tapındıqlarımız beləcə: 1) ST və sintaktik strukturların anlamının açıq-aydınlığını artırmaq ST qısa və asanlaşdırmaqdan daha çox mövcuddur və (2) NMT-in ön-düzəltməsinin təsiri genellikle təmin edilməz olsa da, NMT çıxışlarında bir neçə dəyişiklik mümkün olduğunu düzəltmək üçün daha çox mövcuddur.', 'bs': 'Prije redikcije je proces izmjene izvornog teksta (ST) tako da se može prevesti prema prevodu mašine (MT) u boljoj kvaliteti. Uprkos nepredvidljivosti neuralnog MT (NMT) crnog kutija, predredikcija je raspoređena u različitim praktičnim slučajevima upotrebe MT-a. Iako su mnoge studije pokazale učinkovitost metoda prededitiranja za određene postavke, do sada, duboko razumijevanje o tome što je prededitanje i kako radi za crno-kutiju NMT nedostaje. Da bi izazvali takvo razumijevanje, prošireno smo istraživali ljudske prakse predreditacije. Prvo smo proveli protokol za povećanje snimanja minimalnih editora svakog ST-a i prikupili 6.652 instanca predreditacije u tri smjera prevoda, dva MT-a i četiri tekstna domena. Tada smo analizirali slučajeve iz tri perspektive: karakteristike prededitiranog ST, raznolikost prededitiranih operacija, i utjecaj prededitiranih operacija na ishod NMT-a. Naši nalazi uključuju sljedeće: 1) povećanje objašnjenja značenja ST i njegove sintaktičke strukture je važnije za dobivanje boljih prevoda nego što bi ST kratko i jednostavnije, i (2) iako je učinak prededitiranja na NMT općenito nepredvidljiv, postoje neke tendencije promjena u rezultatima NMT-a ovisno o vrstama editiranja.', 'bn': 'পূর্ববর্তী সম্পাদনা হচ্ছে উৎসের টেক্সট পরিবর্তনের প্রক্রিয়া যাতে মেশিন অনুবাদ (এমটি) ভালো মানে অনুবাদ করতে পারে। কালো বাক্সের নিউরেল এমটি (এনএমটি) এর ভবিষ্যত সত্ত্বেও বিভিন্ন বৈশিষ্ট্যিক এমটি ব্যবহারের ক্ষেত্রে পূর্ববর্তী সম্পাদন যদিও অনেক গবেষণা বিশেষ বৈশিষ্ট্যের পূর্ববর্তী সম্পাদনের পদ্ধতির কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করেছে, এমটির ক্ষেত্রে এনএমটির পূর্ববর্তী সম্পাদন কি এবং কিভা এই ধরনের বুদ্ধিমান উদ্ভাবনের জন্য আমরা ব্যাপক তদন্ত করেছি মানুষের পূর্ববর্তী সম্পাদনার কাজ। আমরা প্রথমে একটি প্রোটোকল বাস্তবায়িত করেছি প্রত্যেক সিস্টেমের জন্য ন্যুনতম সম্পাদনা রেকর্ড করার জন্য এবং তিন অনুবাদের দিকে, দুই এমটি সিস্টেম এবং চার টেক তারপর আমরা তিনটি দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি থেকে এই ঘটনাগুলো বিশ্লেষণ করেছি: পূর্ববর্তী সম্পাদনা স্টিটের চরিত্র, পূর্ববর্তী সম্পাদনার কার্যক্রমের বৈচিত্র্য, এবং এনএমটি  আমাদের আবিস্কারের মধ্যে রয়েছে: (১) এসটির মানে বৃদ্ধির সুস্পষ্ট ব্যাপারে আর তার সিন্টিক্যাক্তিক কাঠামোর মান বৃদ্ধি পাওয়া গুরুত্বপূর্ণ অনুবাদ পাওয়ার চেয়ে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, আর (২) যদিও এনএমটির পূর্ব সম্প', 'cs': 'Předúprava je proces úpravy zdrojového textu (ST) tak, aby mohl být přeložen strojovým překladem (MT) v lepší kvalitě. Navzdory nepředvídatelnosti černé skříňky neuronového MT (NMT) byla preeditace nasazena v různých praktických případech použití MT. Ačkoli mnoho studií prokázalo účinnost metod předúpravy pro konkrétní nastavení, dosud chybí hluboké pochopení o tom, co je předúprava a jak funguje pro černou skříňku NMT. Abychom vyvolali takové porozumění, rozsáhlě jsme zkoumali lidské přededitační postupy. Nejprve jsme implementovali protokol, který postupně zaznamenává minimální úpravy pro každou ST a shromáždili 6,652 instance předúpravy ve třech směrech překladu, dvou MT systémech a čtyřech textových doménách. Následně jsme analyzovali instance ze tří perspektiv: charakteristiky přededitovaného ST, rozmanitost přededitačních operací a vliv přededitačních operací na NMT výstupy. Naše zjištění zahrnují následující: (1) zvýšení explicity významu ST a jeho syntaktické struktury je pro získání lepších překladů důležitější než zkrácení a jednodušší, a (2) i když dopad přededitace na NMT je obecně nepředvídatelný, existují tendence změn ve výstupech NMT v závislosti na typech editačních operací.', 'et': 'Eeltöötlemine on lähteteksti (ST) muutmise protsess, et seda saaks masintõlkega tõlkida paremini. Vaatamata musta kasti neuraalse MT (NMT) ettearvamatusele on eeltöötlemine kasutusele võetud erinevatel praktilistel MT kasutusjuhtudel. Kuigi paljud uuringud on näidanud eeltöötlemismeetodite efektiivsust konkreetsete seadete puhul, puudub siiani sügav arusaam sellest, mis on eeltöötlemine ja kuidas see töötab musta kasti NMT puhul. Sellise mõistmise saavutamiseks uurisime põhjalikult inimeste eeltöötlemise tavasid. Kõigepealt rakendasime protokolli iga ST-i minimaalsete redigeerimiste järkjärguliseks salvestamiseks ja kogusime 6 652 eeltöötlemise eksemplari kolmes tõlkesuunas, kahes MT-süsteemis ja neljas tekstidomeenis. Seejärel analüüsisime juhtumeid kolmest vaatenurgast: eelnevalt toimetatud ST omadused, eelnevate toimetamistoimingute mitmekesisus ja eelnevate toimetamistoimingute mõju NMT väljunditele. Meie tulemused hõlmavad järgmist: (1) ST tähenduse ja selle süntaktilise struktuuri selgesõnalisuse suurendamine on paremate tõlkete saamiseks olulisem kui ST lühemaks ja lihtsamaks muutmine, ja (2) kuigi eeltöötlemise mõju NMT-le on üldiselt ettearvamatu, esineb mõningaid tendentse NMT väljundite muutmiseks sõltuvalt redigeerimistoimingu tüübist.', 'ca': "La pré-edició és el procés de modificar el text de fonts (ST) per poder ser traduit per traducció màquina (MT) d'una millor qualitat. Malgrat l'imprevisibilitat de la MT neural black-box (NMT), la pré-edició s'ha desplegat en diversos casos pràctics d'ús de MT. Encara que molts estudis han demostrat l'eficacia dels mètodes de pré-edició per configuracions específices, fins ara, falta una comprensió profunda del que és pré-edició i de com funciona per a black-box NMT. To elicit such understanding, we extensively investigated human pre-editing practices.  Primer vam implementar un protocol per gravar incrementalment les edicions mínimas per cada ST i vam recollir 6.652 exemples de pré-edició en tres direccions de traducció, dos sistemes MT i quatre dominis de text. Després vam analitzar les instances de tres perspectives: les característiques de la ST pré-editada, la diversitat de les operacions pré-editades i l'impacte de les operacions pré-editades en els productes de la NMT. Els nostres descobriments inclouen els segons: (1) millorar l'explicitat del significat d'una ST i la seva estructura sinàctica és més important per obtenir millors traduccions que fer la ST més curta i senzilla, i (2) tot i que l'impacte de la préedició en la NMT és generalment imprevisible, hi ha algunes tendències de canvis en els resultats de la NMT segons els tipus d'operació d'edició.", 'fi': 'Esimuokkaus on prosessi, jossa lähdetekstiä (ST) muutetaan siten, että se voidaan kääntää konekäännöksellä (MT) laadukkaammin. Black-box neural MT:n (NMT) ennakoimattomuudesta huolimatta esimuokkausta on käytetty useissa käytännön MT:n käyttötapauksissa. Vaikka monet tutkimukset ovat osoittaneet esikäsittelymenetelmien tehokkuuden tietyissä asetuksissa, toistaiseksi ei ole syvällistä ymmärrystä siitä, mitä esikäsittely on ja miten se toimii mustan laatikon NMT:ssä. Tämän ymmärtämisen aikaansaamiseksi tutkimme laajasti ihmisten esieditointikäytäntöjä. Toteutimme ensin protokollan, jolla kirjattiin asteittain jokaisen ST:n vähimmäismuokkaukset, ja keräsimme 6 652 esimuokkaustapausta kolmesta käännössuunnasta, kahdesta MT-järjestelmästä ja neljästä tekstialueesta. Tämän jälkeen analysoimme tapauksia kolmesta näkökulmasta: esimuokatun ST:n ominaispiirteistä, esimuokkaustoimintojen monimuotoisuudesta ja esimuokkaustoimintojen vaikutuksesta NMT:n tuotoksiin. Tutkimustuloksiamme ovat seuraavat: (1) ST:n merkityksen selkeyden ja sen syntaktisen rakenteen parantaminen on tärkeämpää parempien käännösten saamiseksi kuin ST:n lyhentäminen ja yksinkertaisempi, ja (2) vaikka esimuokkauksen vaikutus NMT:hen on yleensä arvaamaton, NMT:n tuotoksissa on joitain taipumuksia editointitoiminnoista riippuen.', 'ha': "@ action: button Bayan da ba'iya ƙayyade neural na-box neural MT (NMT) ba, an deploy pre-editing cikin masu amfani da MT masu yawa. Haƙĩƙa, da yawa aka nuna masu amfani da shiryoyin gaba-editing wa shiryoyin ayuka na daidaita masu ƙayyadadde, har har zuwa yanzu, yana fahimta mai yawa game da wanne-editi ko kuma don ya ƙara shi don ya yi amfani da kwamfyutan-box NMT. Ga mu bayyana fahimta kamar wannan, sai mu yi ƙidãya a cikin aikin mutum na gaba-editi. Mun samar da farkon lokacin da za'a rubũta takardar editori na ƙari kowace na rubutu na rubutu na kasa, kuma mun sami shiryoyin 6,652 na shillin-editi domin shiryoyin tafarki uku, biyu na MT, da sauri na matsayin rubutu. Sa'an nan kuma muka yi anayyar da misãlai daga mito uku: characteristical of the pre-edited St, the variant of pre-editing operons, and the Effective of the pre-editing operons on NMT outputs. FantayinMu na include include the following: (1) To enhance bayyani ga fassarar na wata taska da shi na syntactic, yana da muhimu ga acquire mafi kyau fassarar kuma ta samu mafi sauƙi daga samar fassarar, kuma (2) kuma kõ da yaushe ajin gaba-editi a kan NMT bai zama bayani ba, there are wasu sanyin musanyawa cikin matsayin na NMT, sunã dõgara ga nau'in editori.", 'sk': 'Predurejanje je proces spreminjanja izvornega besedila (ST), tako da ga je mogoče prevesti s strojnim prevodom (MT) v boljši kakovosti. Kljub nepredvidljivosti nevronskega MT (NMT) črne škatle je bila predurejanje uporabljeno v različnih praktičnih primerih uporabe MT. Čeprav so številne študije pokazale učinkovitost metod predurejanja za določene nastavitve, doslej ni poglobljeno razumevanje, kaj je predurejanje in kako deluje pri NMT črni škatli. Da bi pridobili takšno razumevanje, smo obsežno raziskovali človeške prakse pred urejanjem. Najprej smo uvedli protokol za postopno beleženje minimalnih urejanj za vsak ST in zbrali 6.652 primerov predurejanja v treh smereh prevajanja, dveh sistemih MT in štirih besedilnih domenah. Nato smo analizirali primere iz treh perspektiv: značilnosti predurejenega ST, raznolikost operacij predurejanja in vpliv operacij predurejanja na rezultate NMT. Naše ugotovitve vključujejo naslednje: (1) izboljšanje jasnosti pomena ST in njegove sintaktične strukture je pomembnejše za pridobivanje boljših prevodov kot krajše in enostavnejše ST, in (2) čeprav je vpliv predurejanja na NMT na splošno nepredvidljiv, obstajajo nekatere tendence sprememb v izhodih NMT glede na vrste operacij urejanja.', 'bo': 'Pre-editing is the process of modifying the source text (ST) so that it can be translated by machine translation (MT) in a better quality. དེ་བསྟུན་ནས་ཕན་ཚུལ་གྱི་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་ནུས་མཐུན་འགྱུར་མེད་པའི་སྔོན་ཞིབ་སྤྱོད་སྟངས་འདྲ་བྱུང་། Although many studies have demonstrated the effectiveness of pre-editing methods for particular settings, thus far, a deep understanding of what pre-editing is and how it works for black-box NMT is lacking. འདི་ལ་ཕན་པའི་སྐོར་ཆེན་བྱེད་པར་ང་ཚོས་མི་རིགས་ཀྱི་སྔོན་ཞིབ་བསྒྲགས་པའི་བྱ་རིམ་ལ་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་ནང་དུ་ ང་ཚོས་དང་པོ་ནས་ST ཡིན་རེ་རེའི་ནང་དུ་ཆེས་ཤུགས་ཀྱི་ཞུན་དག་ཚད་རྒྱ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཅིག་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་བྱས་པ་ལས་ སྔོན་དུ་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་གནས་ཚུ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་findings include the following: (1) enhancing the explicitness of the meaning of an ST and its syntactic structure is more important for obtaining better translations than making the ST shorter and simpler, and (2) although the impact of pre-editing on NMT is generally unpredictable, there are tendencies of changes in the NMT outputs depending on the editing operation types.', 'he': 'העורך הקודם הוא תהליך שינוי טקסט המקור (ST) כך שיכול להתרגם על ידי תרגום מכונת (MT) באיכות טובה יותר. למרות הבלתי צפוי של MT עצבי קופסה שחורה (NMT), העורך הקודם הופעל במקרים מעשיים שונים של MT. למרות שהרבה מחקרים הוכיחו את היעילות של שיטות לפני העורה למוסדות מסוימות, עד כה, חסרה הבנה עמוקה של מה זה לפני העורה ואיך זה עובד עבור NMT קופסת שחורה. כדי לגרום להבנה כזו, חקרנו באופן רחב תרגילים לפני העורר אנושיים. בהתחלה הפענחנו פרוטוקול כדי להקליט באופן נוסף את העורקים המינימומיים עבור כל ST ואספנו 6,652 מקרים של העורקים מראש בשלושה כיוונים התרגום, שתי מערכות MT, וארבעה תחומות טקסט. לאחר מכן ניתחנו את המקרים משלושה מבטים: את האופיינים של ה-ST המוערכת מראש, את המגוון של פעולות ההערכה מראש, וההשפעה של פעולות ההערכה מראש על יציאות NMT. הממצאים שלנו כוללים את הבאים: (1) השיפור ברור של המשמעות של ST ומבנה הסינטקטי שלו חשוב יותר כדי להשיג תרגומות טובות יותר מאשר להפוך את ST קצרה ופשוטה יותר, ו (2) למרות שההשפעה של העורה הקודמת על NMT היא בדרך כלל בלתי צפויה, יש כמה נטיות של שינויים בתוצאות NMT תלויים בסוגי הפעולה העוררת.', 'jv': 'Ngubah awak-Ngubah iku perusahaan sampeyan Teks Kapan (RT) dadi iki dadi iso terjamahan karo terjamahan sampeyan (MT) lan kaliwat luwih apik. MT (NMT), diumbang ono wektu ngomong sampeyan kanggo ngilangno hukum sistem MT Nanging kabèh akeh basa sing bisalahan penggunaké kapan sistem sing beraksi awak dhéwé, dadi, langgar-langgar kuwi duluran sing sampeyan awak dhéwé, sampeyan awak dhéwé ngerasakno sing bakal terus editasi nggo padha kebutuhan NMT. Rasané awak dhéwé, awak dhéwé luwih beraksi perbudhakan nganggo perkaraan sing diralahé. Awak dhéwé mbéwé éntuk protokol sing gawe nggawe akeh klebu kanggo nyenggawe barang RT karo nggawe barang 6,stah kanggo nyenggawe barang-nyenggawe tresot tarjamahan, siji MT sampeyan sampeyan sampeyan sing katêr. Awak dhéwé énhili perusahaan ing sampeyan telu perspektur: cara-cara sing dibutuhke RT , lan daftar kejahatan operasi layar-editasi, lan nguasai perusahaan operasi layar-editasi ning NMT. Rasané awak dhéwé éntuk kelompok lan: (1) nglanggar kelangan kelangan kelangan seneng pasar seneng pasar seneng kalaayé nggawe tarjamahan luwih dumadhi kanggo nggawe luwih sabên lan seneng (2) sampeyan geulakno ajeng-ajeng NMT kuwi ora bisa Layaran langkung sampeyan geulakno, iso dianggap ajeng-ajeng maneh dumadhi kapan babagan NMT'}
{'en': 'WiC-TSV : An Evaluation Benchmark for Target Sense Verification of Words in Context', 'pt': 'WiC-TSV: Um Benchmark de Avaliação para Verificação do Target Sense de Palavras no Contexto', 'es': 'WIC-TSV: Un punto de referencia de evaluación para la verificación del sentido objetivo de las palabras en contexto', 'ar': 'WiC-TSV: معيار تقييم للتحقق من معنى الكلمات في السياق', 'fr': "WiC-TSV\xa0: Une référence d'évaluation pour la vérification du sens cible des mots en contexte", 'ru': 'WiC-TSV: контрольный показатель оценки для целевой сенсорной проверки слов в контексте', 'ja': 'WiC - TSV ：文脈における単語のターゲットセンス検証のための評価ベンチマーク', 'ga': 'WiC-TSV: Tagarmharc Measúnaithe chun Focail i gComhthéacs a Fhíorú i gCinnt Sprice', 'zh': 'WiC-TSVж›°:дёЉдё‹ж–‡еЌ•иЇЌзџҐеѕЃ', 'hi': 'WiC-TSV: संदर्भ में शब्दों के लक्ष्य भावना सत्यापन के लिए एक मूल्यांकन बेंचमार्क', 'ka': 'Comment', 'el': 'Ένα κριτήριο αξιολόγησης για την επαλήθευση της αίσθησης στόχου των λέξεων στο πλαίσιο', 'hu': 'WiC-TSV: Értékelési referenciaérték a szavak kontextusban történő célérzékeléséhez', 'kk': 'WiC- TSV: Мақсатты сезімді сөздерді контексті тексеру белгісі', 'it': 'WiC-TSV: un benchmark di valutazione per la verifica del senso target delle parole nel contesto', 'lt': 'WiC-TSV: Sąvokų tikslinio jutimo tikrinimo kontekste vertinimo lyginamasis taškas', 'mk': 'WiC-TSV: An Evaluation Benchmark for Target Sense Verification of Words in Context', 'ms': 'WiC-TSV: Bentangan Evaluasi untuk Pengesahan Sensa Sasaran Kata dalam Konteks', 'ml': 'Comment', 'mt': 'WiC-TSV: Benchmark ta’ Evalwazzjoni għall-Verifika tas-Sens fil-Mira tal-Kliem fil-Kuntest', 'mn': 'WiC', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'WiC-TSV: Wskaźnik oceny dla weryfikacji zmysłu docelowego słów w kontekście', 'sr': 'WiC-TSV: Pregled procjene za provjeru osjeæaja ciljeva reèi u kontekstu', 'ro': 'WiC-TSV: Un criteriu de evaluare pentru verificarea simțului țintă a cuvintelor în context', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'WiC-TSV: Qiimeentation Benchmark for Sense of Target', 'ta': 'Comment', 'sv': 'WiC-TSV: En utv채rderingsunders철kning f철r m책lsinnesverifiering av ord i sammanhanget', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Comment=Cần Cần phải kiểm tra cảm xúc của đối tượng', 'bg': 'Показател за оценка на верификацията на думи в контекста на целевото чувство', 'da': 'WiC-TSV: Et benchmark for vurdering af målsansebekræftelse af ord i sammenhæng', 'hr': 'WiC-TSV: Pregled procjene za provjeru osjećaja ciljeva riječi u kontekstu', 'nl': 'WiC-TSV: Een evaluatiebenchmark voor Target Sense Verificatie van woorden in context', 'de': 'WiC-TSV: Ein Evaluations-Benchmark zur Target Sense Verifizierung von Wörtern im Kontext', 'ko': 'WIC-TSV: 언어 환경에서 어휘 목표의 의미 검증에 대한 평가 기준', 'fa': 'Name', 'id': 'WiC-TSV: Sebuah Benchmark Evaluasi untuk Verifikasi Sens Target Kata dalam Konteks', 'sw': 'WiC-TSV: Uthibitisho wa Uthibitisho wa Seneti ya Matokeo', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'WiC-TSV', 'sq': 'WiC-TSV: Një shenjë e vlerësimit për verifikimin e fjalëve në kontekst', 'az': 'WiC-TSV', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'bs': 'WiC-TSV: Pregled procjene za provjeru osjećaja ciljeva riječi u kontekstu', 'hy': 'WiC- TVComment', 'ca': "WiC-TSV: Un punt de referència d'evaluació per la verificació del sentit d'objectiu de les paraules en context", 'bn': 'Comment', 'cs': 'WiC-TSV: Hodnotící Benchmark pro ověření cílového smyslu slov v kontextu', 'et': 'WiC-TSV: sõnade sihtmärgi kontrollimise hindamise võrdlusalus kontekstis', 'fi': 'WiC-TSV: Arvioinnin vertailuarvo Target Sense Verification of Words in Context', 'jv': 'WiC-T SV: an invaluation Bench for TarGet Sense Verification of words in context', 'he': 'Comment', 'sk': 'WiC-TSV: referenčna vrednost za preverjanje ciljnega smisla besed v kontekstu', 'ha': 'WiC-TSV: An Evaluation Benchmark for Target Sense Verification of Words in Context', 'bo': 'WiC-TSV: An Evaluation Benchmark for Target Sense Verification of Words in Context'}
{'en': 'We present WiC-TSV, a new multi-domain evaluation benchmark for Word Sense Disambiguation. More specifically, we introduce a framework for Target Sense Verification of Words in Context which grounds its uniqueness in the formulation as binary classification task thus being independent of external sense inventories, and the coverage of various domains. This makes the dataset highly flexible for the evaluation of a diverse set of models and systems in and across domains. WiC-TSV provides three different evaluation settings, depending on the input signals provided to the model. We set baseline performance on the dataset using state-of-the-art language models. Experimental results show that even though these models can perform decently on the task, there remains a gap between machine and human performance, especially in out-of-domain settings. WiC-TSV data is available at https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'ar': 'نقدم WiC-TSV ، معيار تقييم جديد متعدد المجالات لتوضيح Word Sense. وبشكل أكثر تحديدًا ، نقدم إطارًا للتحقق من الكلمات في السياق بمعنى الهدف والذي يؤسس على تفرده في الصياغة كمهمة تصنيف ثنائية وبالتالي تكون مستقلة عن قوائم جرد المعنى الخارجية وتغطية المجالات المختلفة. هذا يجعل مجموعة البيانات مرنة للغاية لتقييم مجموعة متنوعة من النماذج والأنظمة في وعبر المجالات. يوفر WiC-TSV ثلاثة إعدادات تقييم مختلفة ، اعتمادًا على إشارات الإدخال المقدمة إلى النموذج. وضعنا الأداء الأساسي على مجموعة البيانات باستخدام أحدث النماذج اللغوية. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أنه على الرغم من أن هذه النماذج يمكن أن تؤدي أداءً لائقًا في المهمة ، إلا أنه لا تزال هناك فجوة بين أداء الآلة والأداء البشري ، خاصة في الإعدادات خارج المجال. تتوفر بيانات WiC-TSV على https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'fr': "Nous présentons WiC-TSV, un nouveau benchmark d'évaluation multidomaine pour la désambiguïsation Word Sense. Plus précisément, nous introduisons un cadre pour Target Sense Verification of Words in Context qui fonde son caractère unique dans la formulation en tant que tâche de classification binaire, étant ainsi indépendante des inventaires de sens externes et de la couverture de divers domaines. Cela rend le jeu de données très flexible pour l'évaluation d'un ensemble diversifié de modèles et de systèmes dans et entre les domaines. Le WiC-TSV fournit trois paramètres d'évaluation différents, en fonction des signaux d'entrée fournis au modèle. Nous définissons les performances de base de l'ensemble de données à l'aide de modèles de langage Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que même si ces modèles peuvent fonctionner correctement sur la tâche, il subsiste un écart entre les performances de la machine et les performances humaines, en particulier dans les environnements hors domaine. Les données WiC-TSV sont disponibles à l'adresse https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.", 'es': 'Presentamos WIC-TSV, un nuevo punto de referencia de evaluación multidominio para la desambiguación del sentido de las palabras. Más específicamente, introducimos un marco para la verificación del sentido objetivo de las palabras en contexto que basa su singularidad en la formulación como tarea de clasificación binaria, por lo que es independiente de los inventarios de sentidos externos y la cobertura de varios dominios. Esto hace que el conjunto de datos sea muy flexible para la evaluación de un conjunto diverso de modelos y sistemas en los dominios y entre ellos. WIC-TSV proporciona tres ajustes de evaluación diferentes, según las señales de entrada proporcionadas al modelo. Establecemos el rendimiento de referencia en el conjunto de datos mediante modelos lingüísticos de última Los resultados experimentales muestran que, aunque estos modelos pueden funcionar decentemente en la tarea, sigue habiendo una brecha entre el rendimiento de la máquina y el humano, especialmente en entornos fuera del dominio. Los datos de WIC-TSV están disponibles en https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos o WiC-TSV, um novo benchmark de avaliação multidomínio para a Desambiguação do Word Sense. Mais especificamente, introduzimos um framework para a Verificação do Sentido Alvo de Palavras em Contexto que fundamenta sua singularidade na formulação como tarefa de classificação binária, sendo assim independente de inventários de sentidos externos e da cobertura de vários domínios. Isso torna o conjunto de dados altamente flexível para a avaliação de um conjunto diversificado de modelos e sistemas dentro e entre domínios. O WiC-TSV fornece três configurações de avaliação diferentes, dependendo dos sinais de entrada fornecidos ao modelo. Definimos o desempenho de linha de base no conjunto de dados usando modelos de linguagem de última geração. Os resultados experimentais mostram que, embora esses modelos possam ter um desempenho decente na tarefa, ainda existe uma lacuna entre o desempenho da máquina e o desempenho humano, especialmente em configurações fora do domínio. Os dados WiC-TSV estão disponíveis em https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'ja': 'Word Sense Disambiguationの新しいマルチドメイン評価ベンチマークであるWiC - TSVをご紹介します。より具体的には、コンテキストにおける単語のターゲットセンス検証のためのフレームワークを紹介します。このフレームワークは、バイナリ分類タスクとしての定式化における独自性を根拠としているため、外部センスインベントリ、および様々なドメインのカバレッジとは独立しています。これにより、データセットはドメイン内およびドメイン間の多様なモデルとシステムのセットを評価するために非常に柔軟になります。WiC - TSVは、モデルに提供される入力信号に応じて、3つの異なる評価設定を提供します。最先端の言語モデルを使用して、データセットのベースラインのパフォーマンスを設定します。実験結果は、これらのモデルがタスクで適切に実行できるにもかかわらず、特にドメイン外の環境では、機械と人間のパフォーマンスの間にギャップが残っていることを示しています。WiC - TSVデータは、https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683から入手できます。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем WiC-TSV, новый многодоменный эталон оценки для Word Sense Disambiguation. Более конкретно, мы вводим структуру для целевой сенсорной проверки слов в контексте, которая обосновывает ее уникальность в постановке задачи двоичной классификации, таким образом, будучи независимой от внешних инвентаризаций смысла и охвата различных областей. Это делает набор данных весьма гибким для оценки разнообразного набора моделей и систем в различных областях и между ними. WiC-TSV обеспечивает три различные настройки оценки в зависимости от входных сигналов, предоставляемых модели. Мы устанавливаем базовую производительность на наборе данных, используя современные языковые модели. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что, хотя эти модели могут достойно выполнять задачу, остается разрыв между производительностью машины и человека, особенно в внедоменных условиях. Данные WiC-TSV доступны по адресу https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid WiC-TSV i láthair, tagarmharc meastóireachta il-fearainn nua le haghaidh Disathmbiuation Word Sense. Go sonrach, tugaimid isteach creat le haghaidh Fíorú Smaointe Sprice ar Fhocail i gComhthéacs a bhunaíonn a uathúlacht san fhoirmiú mar thasc aicmithe dhénártha a bheith neamhspleách ar fhardail sheachtracha chiall, agus ar chlúdach na bhfearann éagsúla. Fágann sin go bhfuil an tacar sonraí thar a bheith solúbtha chun sraith éagsúil samhlacha agus córas a mheas i bhfearann agus trasna orthu. Soláthraíonn WiC-TSV trí shuíomh meastóireachta éagsúla, ag brath ar na comharthaí ionchuir a chuirtear ar fáil don mhúnla. Socraíomar feidhmíocht bhonnlíne ar an tacar sonraí ag baint úsáide as samhlacha teanga den scoth. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha, cé gur féidir leis na samhlacha seo feidhmiú go réasúnta ar an tasc, go bhfuil bearna fós idir feidhmíocht an mheaisín agus an duine, go háirithe i suíomhanna lasmuigh den fhearann. Tá sonraí WiC-TSV ar fáil ag https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'hi': 'हम WiC-TSV, Word Sense Disambiguation के लिए एक नया बहु-डोमेन मूल्यांकन बेंचमार्क प्रस्तुत करते हैं। अधिक विशेष रूप से, हम संदर्भ में शब्दों के लक्ष्य भावना सत्यापन के लिए एक रूपरेखा पेश करते हैं जो बाइनरी वर्गीकरण कार्य के रूप में सूत्रीकरण में इसकी विशिष्टता को आधार बनाता है, इस प्रकार बाहरी भावना सूची से स्वतंत्र है, और विभिन्न डोमेन का कवरेज। यह डेटासेट को डोमेन में और भर में मॉडल और सिस्टम के एक विविध सेट के मूल्यांकन के लिए अत्यधिक लचीला बनाता है। WiC-TSV मॉडल को प्रदान किए गए इनपुट संकेतों के आधार पर, तीन अलग-अलग मूल्यांकन सेटिंग्स प्रदान करता है। हम अत्याधुनिक भाषा मॉडल का उपयोग करके डेटासेट पर बेसलाइन प्रदर्शन सेट करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि भले ही ये मॉडल कार्य पर शालीनता से प्रदर्शन कर सकते हैं, मशीन और मानव प्रदर्शन के बीच एक अंतर बना हुआ है, खासकर आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन सेटिंग्स में। WiC-TSV डेटा https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683 पर उपलब्ध है।', 'zh': '余辈介 WiC-TSV,此一新多域评准,施于 Word Sense 消歧义。 更具体地说引入一框架,以上下文中单词者验之,当框架以其在公式之唯一性为二元分类,而独立于外,与百域之覆盖范围。 此使数集高灵,可质域内及跨域诸模统。 WiC-TSV 三品之评置,取决于模形之输信。 用最先进语形于数据集上设基线性能。 实验结果表明虽善其事,机器人相去,特置中焉。 WiC-TSV 数可在 https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683。', 'ka': 'ჩვენ WiC-TSV-ს გაჩვენებთ, ახალი მრავალეთ დიომინის განსაზღვრების ბანქმერი სიტყვების გაგრძელება. უფრო განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ კონტექსტში სიტყვების სიტყვების გადაწყვეტილების ფრამეტში გამოყენებთ, რომელიც განსაკუთრებული სიტყვების განსაკუთრებულობას ფორმეტაციაში იქნება ბინერი კლასიფიკაციის რაოდენობა ეს მონაცემების შესახებ ძალიან გრძნობელია მოდელების და სისტემების განსაზღვრებისთვის. Name ჩვენ მონაცემების სახელის მოდელების გამოყენებით მონაცემების მუშაობა დავყენეთ. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები ჩვენებს, რომ თუმცა ეს მოდელები შეუძლებელია სწორად გავაკეთოთ რაოდენობაში, მაქსინის და ადამიანის წარმოდგენების შორის განსხვავება, გან Name https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a WiC-TSV-t, egy új, több domain értékelési referenciaértéket a Word Sense Disambiguation számára. Konkrétabban bevezetjük a szavak kontextusban történő célérzékelésének ellenőrzéséhez szükséges keretet, amely egyediségét a bináris osztályozási feladatként való megfogalmazásban alapul, így független a külső érzékelési leltároktól és a különböző területek lefedettségétől. Ez rendkívül rugalmassá teszi az adatkészletet a különböző modellek és rendszerek értékeléséhez a területeken belül és azok között. A WiC-TSV három különböző értékelési beállítást biztosít a modell bemeneti jeleitől függően. Az adatkészleten alapvető teljesítményt állítunk be a legkorszerűbb nyelvi modellek segítségével. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy annak ellenére, hogy ezek a modellek tisztességesen teljesítik a feladatot, továbbra is szakadék van a gép és az emberi teljesítmény között, különösen a domain kívüli beállítások esetében. A WiC-TSV adatai a következő címen érhetők el: https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο κριτήριο αξιολόγησης πολλαπλών τομέων για την αποσαφήνιση της λογικής λέξεων. Πιο συγκεκριμένα, εισάγουμε ένα πλαίσιο για την επαλήθευση της αίσθησης στόχου των λέξεων στο πλαίσιο το οποίο θεμελιώνει τη μοναδικότητά του στη διατύπωση ως καθήκοντος δυαδικής ταξινόμησης, ώστε να είναι ανεξάρτητος από τις εξωτερικές συλλογές αισθήσεων και την κάλυψη διαφόρων τομέων. Αυτό καθιστά το σύνολο δεδομένων ιδιαίτερα ευέλικτο για την αξιολόγηση ενός ποικίλου συνόλου μοντέλων και συστημάτων σε και μεταξύ των τομέων. Το σύστημα παρέχει τρεις διαφορετικές ρυθμίσεις αξιολόγησης, ανάλογα με τα σήματα εισόδου που παρέχονται στο μοντέλο. Καθορίζουμε την απόδοση βάσης για το σύνολο δεδομένων χρησιμοποιώντας σύγχρονα μοντέλα γλώσσας. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι παρόλο που αυτά τα μοντέλα μπορούν να επιτελέσουν αξιοπρεπώς στην εργασία, εξακολουθεί να υπάρχει ένα χάσμα μεταξύ της απόδοσης του μηχανήματος και του ανθρώπου, ειδικά σε ρυθμίσεις εκτός πεδίου. Τα δεδομένα WiC-TSV διατίθενται στη διεύθυνση https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'it': "Vi presentiamo WiC-TSV, un nuovo benchmark di valutazione multi-dominio per Word Sense Disambiguation. In particolare, introduciamo un framework per la verifica del senso target delle parole in contesto che fonda la sua unicità nella formulazione come compito di classificazione binaria essendo indipendente dagli inventari dei sensi esterni e dalla copertura di vari domini. Questo rende il set di dati altamente flessibile per la valutazione di un insieme diversificato di modelli e sistemi all'interno e all'interno dei domini. WiC-TSV fornisce tre diverse impostazioni di valutazione, a seconda dei segnali di ingresso forniti al modello. Stabiliamo le prestazioni di base sul set di dati utilizzando modelli linguistici all'avanguardia. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che anche se questi modelli possono eseguire decentemente il compito, rimane un divario tra le prestazioni della macchina e dell'uomo, soprattutto nelle impostazioni fuori dominio. I dati WiC-TSV sono disponibili all'indirizzo https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.", 'kk': 'Біз WiC- TSV- ді, Word Sense Disambiguation үшін жаңа көп доменді бағалау белгісін келтіреміз. Көбірек, біз контекстің мақсатты сезімді сөздерді тексеру үшін қоршау бағдарламасын келтіреміз. Бұл формулацияның бірге бір-біріншілігін бинарлық классификациялау тапсырмасына тәуелді, сондықтан сыртқы сезімді Бұл деректер қорларын домендерде және басқа түрлі моделдер мен жүйелердің бағалау үшін өте гибкілдіреді. Name Біз деректер қорларының негізгі әрекеттерін тіл үлгілерімен қолданып орнатық. Эксперименталдық нәтижелер тапсырмаға дұрыс жұмыс істеу мүмкіндігін көрсетеді, бірақ машина мен адамдардың істеу арасында, осылайша доменге тыс параметрлерде орындалады. WiC- TSV деректері бар https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'lt': 'We present WiC-TSV, a new multi-domain evaluation benchmark for Word Sense Disambiguation.  More specifically, we introduce a framework for Target Sense Verification of Words in Context which grounds its uniqueness in the formulation as binary classification task thus being independent of external sense inventories, and the coverage of various domains.  This makes the dataset highly flexible for the evaluation of a diverse set of models and systems in and across domains.  WiC-TSV provides three different evaluation settings, depending on the input signals provided to the model.  We set baseline performance on the dataset using state-of-the-art language models.  Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad nors šie modeliai gali tinkamai atlikti užduotį, vis dar lieka spraga tarp mašinos ir žmogaus veiklos, ypač ne srityse. WiC-TSV duomenys pateikiami interneto svetainėje https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'ms': 'We present WiC-TSV, a new multi-domain evaluation benchmark for Word Sense Disambiguation.  More specifically, we introduce a framework for Target Sense Verification of Words in Context which grounds its uniqueness in the formulation as binary classification task thus being independent of external sense inventories, and the coverage of various domains.  This makes the dataset highly flexible for the evaluation of a diverse set of models and systems in and across domains.  WiC-TSV provides three different evaluation settings, depending on the input signals provided to the model.  Kami tetapkan prestasi dasar pada set data menggunakan model bahasa-state-of-the-art. Experimental results show that even though these models can perform decently on the task, there remains a gap between machine and human performance, especially in out-of-domain settings.  Data WiC-TSV tersedia di https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'ml': 'ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിസി-ടിഎസ്\u200cവി, ഒരു പുതിയ മുള്\u200dട്ടി-ഡോമെന്\u200d വിലാസങ്ങളുടെ ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് കാണിക്കുന്നു. വാക്ക് സെ More specifically, we introduce a framework for Target Sense Verification of Words in Context which grounds its uniqueness in the formulation as binary classification task thus being independent of external sense inventories, and the coverage of various domains.  This makes the dataset highly flexible for the evaluation of a diverse set of models and systems in and across domains.  Name നമ്മള്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d ബേസ്ലൈന്\u200d പ്രകടനം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ്- ആർട്ട് ഭാഷ മോഡ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ജോലിയില്\u200d നല്ല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുമെങ്കിലും മെഷീനും മനുഷ്യരുടെ  WiC- TSV ഡേറ്റാ ലഭ്യമല്ല https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'mt': 'We present WiC-TSV, a new multi-domain evaluation benchmark for Word Sense Disambiguation.  B’mod aktar speċifiku, a ħna nintroduċu qafas għall-Verifika Sensa fil-Kuntest tal-Kliem fil-Mira li jiġġustifika l-unikità tiegħu fil-formulazzjoni bħala kompitu ta’ klassifikazzjoni binarja biex b’hekk ikun indipendenti mill-inventarji tas-sens estern, u l-kopertura ta’ diversi oqsma. Dan jagħmel is-sett tad-dejta flessibbli ħafna għall-evalwazzjoni ta’ sett varjat ta’ mudelli u sistemi f’oqsma u f’oqsma differenti. WiC-TSV jipprovdi tliet settijiet differenti ta’ evalwazzjoni, skont is-sinjali ta’ input ipprovduti lill-mudell. We set baseline performance on the dataset using state-of-the-art language models.  Experimental results show that even though these models can perform decently on the task, there remains a gap between machine and human performance, especially in out-of-domain settings.  WiC-TSV data is available at  https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer WiC- TSV, eit ny multidomeneevalueringsbenchmark for word Sense Disambiguation. Dette er meir spesifikt at vi introduserer eit rammeverk for målsettingskontroll av ord i kontekst som grunner sine unikeitet i formasjonen som binærklassifikasjonsverktøyet derfor er uavhengig av eksterne sentensopplysningar og omdekking av ulike domene. Dette gjer datasettet svært fleksibel for evaluering av ein ulike sett modell og systemer i og over domene. WiC- TSV tilbyr tre ulike evalueringsinnstillingar, avhengig av inndatasignalen som er tilgjengelege til modellen. Vi bestemmer baseline utføringar på datasettet ved å bruka ståande- av- kunstspråk- modeller. Eksperimentale resultat viser at selv om desse modelane kan utføra riktig på oppgåva, er det eit mellomrom mellom maskinen og menneskelige utviklingar, spesielt i innstillingane uten domenet. WiC- TSV- data er tilgjengeleg på https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'mn': 'Бид WiC-TSV, Word Sense Disambiguation-ын шинэ олон холбоотой оюутнуудын шалгалтыг харуулж байна. Илүү тодорхойлолтой нь, бид Контекст дээрх Target Sense Words Verification-ын хөтөлбөрийг танилцуулдаг. Энэ нь томъёогоор хоёр дахь хэлбэрийн ажил гэсэн үг. Иймээс гадаад мэдрэмжтэй санааны бүтээгдэхүүнээс хамааралтай байдаг. Энэ нь өгөгдлийн санг олон төрлийн загвар, системуудын үнэлгээнд маш их гишүүн болгодог. WiC-TSV загварт өгсөн орнуудын сигналуудын хамааралтай гурван өөр дүгнэлтийн тохируулалт гаргадаг. Бид өгөгдлийн сангийн үндсэн үйл ажиллагааг урлагийн хэл загварыг ашиглаж байдаг. Эдгээр загварууд ажил дээр сайн ажиллаж чадна ч гэсэн машин болон хүн төрөлхтний ажиллагааны хооронд ялангуяа хоорондох зай байдаг. WiC-TSV өгөгдлийн мэдээллүүд https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy WiC-TSV, nowy standard oceny wielu domen dla Word Sense Disambiguation. W szczególności wprowadzamy framework dla Target Sense Verification of Words in Context, który uzasadnia swoją wyjątkowość w formułowaniu zadania klasyfikacji binarnej, dzięki czemu jest niezależny od zewnętrznych inwentaryzacji zmysłów i pokrycia różnych dziedzin. Dzięki temu zbiór danych jest bardzo elastyczny do oceny różnorodnego zestawu modeli i systemów w różnych dziedzinach i między nimi. WiC-TSV zapewnia trzy różne ustawienia oceny, w zależności od sygnałów wejściowych dostarczanych do modelu. Ustawiamy wydajność bazową dla zbioru danych przy użyciu najnowocześniejszych modeli językowych. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że chociaż modele te mogą wykonywać zadanie przyzwoicie, pozostaje luka między wydajnością maszyny a ludzi, zwłaszcza w ustawieniach poza domeną. Dane WiC-TSV są dostępne na stronie internetowej https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm WiC-TSV, un nou criteriu de evaluare multidomeniu pentru dezambiguizarea Word Sense. Mai exact, introducem un cadru pentru verificarea simțurilor țintă a cuvintelor în context, care își bazează unicitatea în formularea ca sarcină de clasificare binară, fiind astfel independent de inventarele simțurilor externe și de acoperirea diferitelor domenii. Acest lucru face ca setul de date să fie extrem de flexibil pentru evaluarea unui set divers de modele și sisteme în și între domenii. WiC-TSV oferă trei setări diferite de evaluare, în funcție de semnalele de intrare furnizate modelului. Stabilim performanța de bază a setului de date folosind modele lingvistice de ultimă generație. Rezultatele experimentale arată că, deși aceste modele pot efectua în mod decent sarcina, rămâne un decalaj între performanța mașinii și cea umană, în special în setările din afara domeniului. Datele WiC-TSV sunt disponibile la adresa https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo WiC-TSV, novi nivo procjene multidomenata za Disambiguaciju osjećaja reči. Posebnije, predstavljamo okvir za provjeru reèi o cilju u kontekstu koji temelji njegovu jedinstvenost u formulaciji kao dvojni zadatak klasifikacije, tako da je nezavisan od inventorija vanjskih smisla i pokrivanja različitih domena. To čini kompletu podataka vrlo fleksibilnom za procjenu različitih modela i sistema u i preko domena. WiC-TSV pruža tri različite nastave za procjenu, ovisno o ulaznim signalima pruženim modelu. Postavili smo početne izvedbe na setu podataka koristeći modele umjetnosti. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da iako ovi modeli mogu pristojno izvršiti na zadatku, ostaje praznina između mašine i ljudske funkcije, posebno u izvan domena. Podaci WiC- TSV su dostupni na https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'si': 'අපි WiC-TSV වෙනුවෙන්, අළුත් විශේෂ විශේෂ බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂ කරනවා. තව විශේෂයෙන්, අපි ලක්ෂණ සංවේදනයේ වචන පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා විශේෂණය මේක නිර්මාණය සහ පද්ධතියක් වෙනස් මොඩල් සහ පද්ධතියක් ඇතුලට සමඟ විවිදියට පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා දත්ත සැට් විශ Name අපි දත්ත සූදානයේ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියාගත්තා නිර්මාණය කරන්නේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක භාෂා මොඩල් භාෂාව භ පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ මේ මොඩේල් එක්ක වැඩේ හොඳින් වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් නම්, මිනිස්සු වැඩේ අතර අ WiC- TSV දත්ත පුළුවන් https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'so': 'WiC-TSV (WiC-TSV) waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa kaartaynta qiimeynta guryaha badan ee ereyga degenaanshaha. More specifically, we introduce a framework for Target Sense Verification of Words in Context which grounds its uniqueness in the formulation as binary classification task thus being independent of external sense inventories, and the coverage of various domains.  Taas waxay ka dhigaysaa in lagu qiimeeyo tusaalooyin kala duduwan iyo nidaam kala duduwan ee gudaha iyo gudaha. WiC-TSV wuxuu fidiyaa saddex qaab oo kala duduwan sawirada qiimeynta, iyadoo ku xiran sawirada midowga lagu siiyo. We set baseline performance on the dataset using state-of-the-art language models.  Imtixaanka waxaa tusaya in xataa in kastoo sameynta qaababkan ay si fiican u sameyn karaan shaqada, dhaqdhaqaaqa dhaqdhaqaaqa mashiinka iyo dabeecada dadka dhexdooda, khusuusan goobaha degmooyinka ka baxsan. Macluumaadyada WiC-TSV waxaad ka heli kartaa https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar WiC-TSV, ett nytt riktmärke för utvärdering av flera domäner för Word Sense Disambiguation. Mer specifikt introducerar vi ett ramverk för Target Sense Verification of Words in Context som grundar dess unika karaktär i formuleringen som binär klassificeringsuppgift och därmed vara oberoende av externa sinnesförteckningar och täckningen av olika domäner. Detta gör datauppsättningen mycket flexibel för utvärdering av en mängd olika modeller och system inom och mellan domäner. WiC-TSV tillhandahåller tre olika utvärderingsinställningar, beroende på vilka ingångssignaler som levereras till modellen. Vi ställer in baslinjeprestanda för datauppsättningen med hjälp av toppmoderna språkmodeller. Experimentella resultat visar att även om dessa modeller kan prestera anständigt på uppgiften, finns det fortfarande ett gap mellan maskin och mänsklig prestanda, särskilt i inställningar utanför domänen. WiC-TSV-data finns tillgängliga på https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'ur': 'ہم WiC-TSV کو پیش کریں گے، ایک نئی ملتی-ڈومین ارزیابی بنچم پر Word Sense Disambiguation کے لئے۔ اور اس سے زیادہ مشخص ہے کہ ہم ایک فرمول کے لئے مقررہ سمجھ کے کلمات کی تحقیق کے لئے ایک فرمول پیش کریں جو فرمول میں اس کی یونیکی کی بنیاد رکھتا ہے کہ اس طرح بائناری سمجھ کے مخلوقات سے بے نیاز ہے اور مختلف ڈومین کی پورش بھی۔ یہ ڈاٹ سٹ کو ایک مختلف موڈل اور سیسٹم کی ارزیابی کے لئے بہت اضافہ کر دیتا ہے۔ Name ہم نے ڈاٹ سٹ پر بنیاس لین کی پرورشش کو ایٹ آرت کی زبان مدل کے مطابق مقرر کیا ہے. Experimental results show that although these models can perform properly on the task, there is a gap between machine and human performance, especially out-domain settings. Name https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'ta': 'We present WiC-TSV, a new multi-domain evaluation benchmark for Word Sense Disambiguation.  மேலும் குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் சூழலில் உள்ள இலக்கு உணர்வு சொல்லும் செல்லுதல் செயல்களை அறிவிக்கும் சட்டத்தை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். இது தனிப்பட்ட தனிப்பட்டதாக உருவாக்க இது மிகவும் flexible for evaluating a variety of models and systems in and across domains. WiC- TSV மூன்று வேறு வித்தியாசமான evaluation அமைப்புகளை வழங்குகிறது, மாதிரியில் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட உள்ளீட்டு குறிகளை  நாம் தரவுத்தளத்தின் அடிப்படையில் செயல்பாட்டை நிலை- கலை மொழி மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்தி அமைக்கிறோம். சோதனை முடிவு WiC- TSV தகவல் கிடைக்கும் https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'mk': 'We present WiC-TSV, a new multi-domain evaluation benchmark for Word Sense Disambiguation.  More specifically, we introduce a framework for Target Sense Verification of Words in Context which grounds its uniqueness in the formulation as binary classification task thus being independent of external sense inventories, and the coverage of various domains.  This makes the dataset highly flexible for the evaluation of a diverse set of models and systems in and across domains.  WiC- TSV обезбедува три различни поставувања за проценка, во зависност од внатрешните сигнали обезбедени за моделот. Го поставуваме основниот резултат на податоците користејќи најнови јазички модели. Experimental results show that even though these models can perform decently on the task, there remains a gap between machine and human performance, especially in out-of-domain settings.  WiC-TSV data is available at  https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'uz': "Biz WiC-TSV, bir necha domen qiymatni yangi so'zlar sezgiruvchiga qiymatish benchmark. Ko'rsatilgan, biz tarkibida so'zlar sertifikatlarini tasdiqlash uchun foydalanamiz. Bu bir ikki darajalashtirish vazifasi sababchi bo'ladi. Bu sababda tashqi ma'lumotlar muvaffaqiyatlaridan foydalanuvchi va har xil domenelarni qarashga imkoniyat emas. Name Name Maʼlumotlar bazasi bazasining bazasini bir xil tilning holati modeli yordamida qoʻlladik. Tajriba natijalari shu modellar vazifani yaxshi bajarishi mumkin, ammo mashina va inson amalning orasidagi gap keladi. WiC-TSV data is available at  https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu WiC-TSV, một tiêu chuẩn đánh giá đa miền mới cho biến đổi Từ Thời Báo. Cụ thể hơn, chúng tôi giới thiệu một cơ sở để kiểm tra cảm xúc đích thị của ngôn từ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ chung, nó căn cứ cho sự đặc biệt của nó trong cách phân tích nhị phân loại, do đó không phụ thuộc vào các nhà kho cảm giác bề ngoài, và bao gồm các khu vực khác nhau. Việc này làm cho bộ dữ liệu rất linh hoạt để đánh giá một loạt các mô hình và hệ thống khác nhau trong và trong mỗi miền. Hệ thống WiC-TSV cung cấp ba thiết lập đánh giá khác nhau, phụ thuộc vào tín hiệu nhập được cung cấp cho mô hình. Chúng tôi đặt lợi thế cơ sở dữ liệu bằng các mẫu ngôn ngữ hiện đại. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy mặc dù những mô hình này có thể thực hiện một cách tử tế trong nhiệm vụ, vẫn còn một khoảng cách giữa sức khỏe máy móc và con người, đặc biệt là trong môi trường ngoài miền. Dữ liệu WiC-TSV có sẵn ở... https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'bg': 'Представяме ви нов многодомейнен еталон за оценка на дисамбигуацията. По-конкретно, въвеждаме рамка за верификация на думи в контекст, която основава своята уникалност при формулирането като задача за двоична класификация, като по този начин е независима от външните сетивни инвентаризации и обхващането на различни области. Това прави набора от данни изключително гъвкав за оценка на разнообразен набор от модели и системи в и между области. Предоставя три различни настройки за оценка, в зависимост от входните сигнали, предоставени на модела. Задаваме базовата ефективност на набора от данни, използвайки най-съвременни езикови модели. Експерименталните резултати показват, че въпреки че тези модели могат да изпълняват достойно задачата, остава празнота между машинното и човешкото представяне, особено при настройки извън домейна. Данните за WiC- TSV са налични на адрес: https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo WiC-TSV, novi nivo procjene multidomenata za Disambiguaciju osjećaja riječi. Posebnije, predstavljamo okvir provjere riječi o cilju u kontekstu koji temelji njegovoj jedinstvenosti u formulaciji kao dvojni zadatak klasifikacije, tako da je nezavisan od inventara vanjskog smisla i pokrivanja različitih domena. To čini kompletu podataka vrlo fleksibilnom za procjenu različitih modela i sustava u i preko domena. WiC-TSV pruža tri različite nastave za procjenu ovisno o ulaznim signalima pruženim modelu. Postavili smo početnu izvedbu na setu podataka koristeći modele umjetnosti. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da iako ovi modeli mogu pristojno izvršiti na zadatku, ostaje praznina između strojeva i ljudske funkcije, posebno u izvan domena. Podaci WiC- TSV dostupni su na https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer WiC-TSV, en ny multi-domæne evaluering benchmark for Word Sense Disambiguation. Mere specifikt introducerer vi en ramme for Target Sense Verification of Words in Context, som baserer dens unikke karakter i formuleringen som binær klassifikationsopgave og dermed er uafhængig af eksterne sanseoversigter, og dækningen af forskellige domæner. Dette gør datasættet meget fleksibelt til evaluering af et forskelligartet sæt modeller og systemer inden for og på tværs af domæner. WiC-TSV giver tre forskellige evalueringsindstillinger afhængigt af de input signaler, der leveres til modellen. Vi sætter baseline performance på datasættet ved hjælp af state-of-the-art sprogmodeller. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at selvom disse modeller kan udføre anstændigt på opgaven, er der stadig et hul mellem maskinens og menneskets ydeevne, især i uden for domænet indstillinger. WiC-TSV data er tilgængelige på https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'nl': 'We presenteren WiC-TSV, een nieuwe multi-domein evaluatie benchmark voor Word Sense Disambiguation. Meer specifiek introduceren we een raamwerk voor Target Sense Verification of Words in Context dat zijn uniciteit in de formulering als binaire classificatietaak onderbouwt en dus onafhankelijk is van externe zintuiginventarissen en de dekking van verschillende domeinen. Dit maakt de dataset zeer flexibel voor de evaluatie van een diverse set modellen en systemen in en over domeinen heen. WiC-TSV biedt drie verschillende evaluatieinstellingen, afhankelijk van de ingangssignalen die aan het model worden verstrekt. We stellen baseline prestaties op de dataset in met behulp van state-of-the-art taalmodellen. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat, hoewel deze modellen behoorlijk kunnen presteren op de taak, er een kloof blijft tussen machine en menselijke prestaties, vooral in out-of-domain settings. WiC-TSV-gegevens zijn beschikbaar op: https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan WiC-TSV, benchmark evaluasi multi-domain baru untuk Word Sense Disambiguation. Lebih spesifik, kami memperkenalkan rangkaian untuk Verifikasi Sens Target dari kata-kata dalam Konteks yang mendasarkan unik dalam formulasi sebagai tugas klasifikasi binari sehingga menjadi independen dari inventaris sensor luar, dan penyamaran berbagai domain. Ini membuat dataset sangat fleksibel untuk evaluasi set berbagai model dan sistem dalam dan melintasi domain. WiC-TSV menyediakan tiga pengaturan evaluasi yang berbeda, tergantung pada sinyal input yang disediakan untuk model. Kami menetapkan prestasi dasar pada set data menggunakan model bahasa state-of-the-art. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa meskipun model ini dapat melakukan dengan layak dalam tugas, masih ada ruang antara mesin dan prestasi manusia, terutama dalam pengaturan luar domain. Data WiC-TSV tersedia di https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren WiC-TSV, einen neuen Multi-Domain Evaluation Benchmark für Word Sense Disambiguation. Konkret stellen wir ein Framework für Target Sense Verification of Words in Context vor, das seine Einzigartigkeit in der Formulierung als binäre Klassifikationsaufgabe begründet und somit unabhängig von externen Sinninventaren und der Abdeckung verschiedener Domänen ist. Dadurch ist der Datensatz hochflexibel für die Auswertung unterschiedlichster Modelle und Systeme in und über Domänen hinweg. WiC-TSV bietet drei verschiedene Auswerteeinstellungen, abhängig von den Eingangssignalen, die dem Modell zur Verfügung gestellt werden. Wir legen die Basisleistung für den Datensatz mithilfe modernster Sprachmodelle fest. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass, obwohl diese Modelle die Aufgabe anständig erfüllen können, eine Lücke zwischen der Leistung von Maschine und Mensch besteht, insbesondere in außerdomänen Umgebungen. WiC-TSV Daten sind verfügbar unter https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'fa': 'ما WiC-TSV را نشان می دهیم، یک مقدار ارزیابی چند دومین جدید برای ناپدید کردن کلمه حس کلمه. دقیقاً ما یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچ این مجموعه داده\u200cها را برای ارزیابی مجموعه\u200cای از مدل\u200cها و سیستم\u200cهای مختلف در و در سراسر دامنه\u200cها بسیار flexible می\u200cکند. Name ما اجرای پایین\u200cخط روی مجموعه داده\u200cها را با استفاده از مدل\u200cهای زبان\u200cهنری قرار دادیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که هر چند این مدل\u200cها می\u200cتوانند در این کار خوب انجام دهند، فاصله بین ماشین و عملکرد انسان باقی ماند، مخصوصا در تنظیمات خارج از دومین. داده\u200cهای WiC- TSV در https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'ko': '의미 불일치를 없애기 위한 새로운 다영역 평가 기준인 WIC TSV를 제시했습니다.더욱 구체적으로 말하자면 우리는 상하문에서 단어의 목표적 의미 검증의 구조를 도입했다. 이 구조는 단어가 표현에서의 유일성을 이원적 분류 임무로 삼아 외부적 의미 목록과 각 분야의 커버 범위에 독립시켰다.이로써 데이터가 평가 분야와 분야를 뛰어넘는 각종 모델과 시스템에 집합될 때 높은 유연성을 가지게 된다.WIC TSV는 모델에 제공된 입력 신호에 따라 세 가지 다른 평가 설정을 제공합니다.우리는 가장 선진적인 언어 모델을 사용하여 데이터 집합에 기본 성능을 설정한다.실험 결과에 따르면 이러한 모델은 임무에서 양호하게 표현될 수 있으나 기계의 성능과 사람의 성능 사이에는 여전히 차이가 존재하는데 특히 역외 환경에서 그렇다.WIC TSV 데이터는https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'sw': 'Tunawasilisha WiC-TSV, bendera mpya ya uchunguzi wa maeneo mengi ya ndani kwa ajili ya kukabiliana na Sensi. Zaidi zaidi, tunaanzisha mfumo wa Uchunguzi wa Hadithi wa Tarehe ya Uchunguzi wa Mazingira ambayo unasababisha ukweli wake katika utengenezaji wa juhudi la kutangaza mbili kwa hiyo kuwa huru wa ubunifu wa hisia za nje, na taarifa za maeneo mbalimbali. Hii inafanya taarifa yenye ubunifu sana kwa ajili ya kutathmini mfumo mbalimbali wa mifano na mifumo katika maeneo mbalimbali. WiC-TSV inatoa mipango mitatu tofauti tofauti ya uchunguzi, kutegemea na alama za input zinazotolewa kwa mtindo huo. We set baseline performance on the dataset using state-of-the-art language models.  Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba hata kama mifano hii inaweza kufanya kazi kwa ukarimu, bado kuna tofauti kati ya utendaji wa mashine na binadamu, hasa katika mazingira ya nje ya ndani. Takwimu za WiC-TSV zinapatikana kwa https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'af': "Ons voorsien WiC- TSV, 'n nuwe multi- domein evaluering benchmark vir Woord Sense Ontbreking. More specifically, we introduce a framework for Target Sense Verifisering of Words in Context which grounds its uniqueness in the formulation as binary classification task thus being independent of external sense inventories, and the coverage of various domains. Hierdie maak die datastel baie fleksibel vir die evaluering van 'n verskeie stel modele en stelsels in en oor domeine. Name Ons stel basisline prestasie op die datastel gebruik state-of-the-art taal modele. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat selfs hierdie modele behoorlik kan uitvoer op die taak, daar bly 'n spans tussen masjien en menslike prestasie, spesiaal in buite-domein instellings. @ info: status https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.", 'tr': "Biz WiC-TSV'i, Word Sense Disambiguation için yeni bir çoklu domain değerlendirme benchmark sunuyoruz. Aýratyn görä, Kontekstde maksadyň sözleriniň barlamasynyň bir çerçevesini girdirip, bu şekilde bir baýlyklygyny iki klasifikasyon täblisasy diýip, daşaryk duýumyň inventoriýasyndan we çeşitli sahypalaryň kapalygyny belleýär. Bu, veri setini dürli modeller we sistemler arasynda we daýlar sistemlerinin deňlemesi üçin örän fleksibil edip bilýär. Name Biz sanat setirine meýdança çykyşlygyny sungat dili nusgalaryndan ullanýarys. Experimental netijeleri şol nusgalar işe adalat edip biljek bolsa hem maşynyň we adamlaryň etkinlik arasynda gap bolmagyny görkezýär, ýöne bu nusgalar daşaryk düzümlerinde. Maglumat ýerleşýär https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.", 'am': 'አዲስ የብዙ ዶሜን ማስታወቂያ የቃላት የሳንሱር ውጤት አቅርብ እናቀርባለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የውጭ የስህተት ግንኙነት እና የአካባቢ ግንኙነት የቃላትን መክፈት እናስጠጋለን፡፡ ይህ የዳታ ሳጥን በተለየ የዓይነት ዓይነቶች እና ስርዓቶች በተለየ ውይይቶች ውስጥ እና በአካባቢዎች ውስጥ ለመevaluት እጅግ ብልሃተኛ ያደርጋል፡፡ WiC-TSV የቋንቋ-የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎችን በመጠቀም የመድረክ ደረጃዎችን አካሄድን፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች እንደሆነ እነዚህ ምሳሌዎች በሥራው ላይ በመልካም ቢችሉ እንኳ፣ በመኪና እና በሰው ፍላጎት መካከል፣ በተለይም ውጭ ከዶሜን አካባቢዎች መካከል ውጤት ይኖራል፡፡ WiC-TSV data available at https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'hy': "Մենք ներկայացնում ենք WiC-TVը, բազմաբնույթի գնահատման նոր համեմատային արտահայտություն Word Sense Discovery-ի համար: Ավելի հատկապես, մենք ներկայացնում ենք կոնտեքստում բառերի նշանակալի զգայական ստուգում մի շրջանակ, որը հիմնավորում է դրա միանգամայն բանաձևության որպես երկարային դասակարգման առաջադրանք' անկախ լինելով արտաքին զգայական գյուղերից և տարբեր բնագավառների ծա Սա շատ ճկուն է դարձնում տվյալների համակարգը տիեզերքում և տարբեր տիեզերքում բազմազան մոդելների և համակարգերի գնահատման համար: WiC-TVն ապահովում է երեք տարբեր գնահատման կարգավորումներ, կախված մոդելի ներմուծման ազդանշաններից: Մենք տվյալների համակարգի հիմնական արտադրողականությունը որոշում ենք օգտագործելով ամենաբարձր լեզվի մոդելներ: Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ չնայած որ այս մոդելները կարող են հարմար կերպով աշխատել այս խնդրի վրա, դեռևս կա տարբերություն մեքենայի և մարդկային արդյունքների միջև, հատկապես արտաքին միջավայրում: WiC- PSV տվյալները հասանելի են https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.", 'az': "Biz WiC-TSV'i, sözlərin Sense Disambiguasyonu üçün yeni çoxlu domena değerlendirməsi benchmark göstəririk. Daha çox xüsusiyyətli olaraq, Kontekstdə Heç Sensi Sözlərinin Verifikası üçün bir framework ü təşkil edirik ki, formülasyonu iki klasifikasiya görevi kimi təşkil edir. Beləliklə, dış hiss in şallarından bağımsız və müxtəlif domenin örtüsünü təşkil edir. Bu, dağlar qurduğu müxtəlif modellərin və sistemlərin değerlendirməsi üçün çox fleksibildir. WiC-TSV modellə verilən giriş sinyallərinə bağlı üç müxtəlif değerlendirmə qurğuları təmin edir. Biz məlumatların qurğularını sanat dili modelləri ilə istifadə edirik. Experimental sonuçları göstərir ki, bu modellər işlərdə yaxşı işlər edə bilərsə də, maşın və insan performansı arasında, özlərinə də domenin dışı quruluşlarında bir ayrılıq var. WiC-TSV məlumatı faydalanır https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.", 'bn': 'আমরা উইসি-টিএসভিকে উপস্থাপন করছি, একটি নতুন মাল্টিডোমেইন মূল্যায়ন বেনম্যার্ক, শব্দ সেন্স বিভ্রান্তির জন্য। বিশেষ করে আমরা বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভ This makes the dataset highly flexible for the evaluation of a diverse set of models and systems in and across domains.  উইসি- টিএসভি মডেলে প্রদান করা ইনপুট সিগন্যালের উপর নির্ভর করে তিনটি ভিন্ন মূল্যায়ন বৈশিষ্ট্য প্রদান করে। আমরা ডাটাসেটে বেসেলাইনের অনুষ্ঠান নির্ধারণ করেছি রাষ্ট্র-of-the-art ভাষা মডেল ব্যবহার করে। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে যদিও এই মডেলগুলো কাজে সঠিকভাবে পালন করতে পারে, তবে মেশিন এবং মানুষের প্রদর্শনের মধ্যে একটি পার্থক্য রয়েছে, বিশে উইসি- TSV তথ্য উপস্থিত https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo WiC-TSV, novi nivo procjene multidomenata za Disambiguaciju osjećaja riječi. Posebnije, predstavljamo okvir za provjeru osjetljivih riječi u kontekstu koji temelji njegovoj jedinstvenosti u formulaciji kao dvojni zadatak klasifikacije, tako da je nezavisan od inventorija vanjskih smisla i pokrivanja različitih domena. To čini kompletu podataka vrlo fleksibilnom za procjenu različitih modela i sustava u i preko domena. WiC-TSV pruža tri različite nastave za procjenu, ovisno o ulaznim signalima pruženim modelu. Postavili smo početnu izvedbu na setu podataka koristeći modele umjetnosti. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da iako ovi modeli mogu pristojno izvršiti na zadatku, ostaje praznina između mašine i ljudske funkcije, posebno u izvan domena. Podaci WiC-TSV su dostupni na https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'ca': "Presentam WiC-TSV, un nou punt de referència d'evaluació multidominiu per desambiguació del sentit de paraules. Més específicament, introduïm un marc per a la Verificació Sensible de paraules en Context que funda la seva únicitat en la formulació com a tasca de classificació binaria, estant així independents dels inventaris de sentits externs, i la cobertura de diversos dominis. Això fa que el conjunt de dades sigui molt flexible per a l'evaluació d'un conjunt de models i sistemes diversos en i entre dominis. WiC-TSV proporciona tres opcions d'evaluació diferents, segons els senyals d'entrada proporcionats al model. Establecem el rendiment de base en el conjunt de dades utilitzant models de llenguatge més moderns. Els resultats experimentals mostren que encara que aquests models poden actuar de manera decent en la tasca, encara hi ha una bretxa entre el desempeny de la màquina i el desempeny humà, especialment en ambients fora de domini. Les dades WiC-TSV estan disponibles en https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.", 'cs': 'Představujeme WiC-TSV, nový vícedoménový standard hodnocení pro Word Sense Disambiguation. Konkrétněji představujeme rámec pro Target Sense Verification of Words in Context, který zakládá svou jedinečnost ve formulaci binární klasifikační úlohy a je tak nezávislý na externích smyslových inventářích a pokrytí různých domén. Díky tomu je datová sada vysoce flexibilní pro hodnocení různorodé sady modelů a systémů v oblastech a napříč nimi. WiC-TSV poskytuje tři různá nastavení hodnocení v závislosti na vstupních signálech poskytnutých modelu. Na datové sadě jsme nastavili základní výkon pomocí nejmodernějších jazykových modelů. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že i když tyto modely dokážou plnit úkol slušně, zůstává mezera mezi výkonem stroje a lidí, zejména v mimo doménu nastavení. Údaje WiC-TSV jsou k dispozici na adrese https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'et': 'Esitleme WiC-TSV, uut mitmedomeenilist hindamise võrdlusalust Word Sense Disambiguatsiooni jaoks. Täpsemalt võtame kasutusele raamistiku sõnade sihtmärkide kontrollimiseks kontekstis, mis põhjendab selle ainulaadsust sõnastamisel binaarse klassifitseerimisülesandena, olles seega sõltumatu välistest tähenduste inventuuridest ja erinevate valdkondade katvusest. See muudab andmekogumi väga paindlikuks erinevate mudelite ja süsteemide hindamiseks valdkondades ja valdkondades. WiC-TSV pakub kolme erinevat hindamisseadet, sõltuvalt mudelile edastatavatest sisendisignaalidest. Seadsime andmekogumi baasjõudluse, kasutades kaasaegseid keelemudeleid. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et kuigi need mudelid suudavad ülesande täitmisel korralikult toimida, jääb masina ja inimese jõudluse vahele lõhe, eriti valdkonnavälistes seadetes. WiC-TSV andmed on kättesaadavad aadressil https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme WiC-TSV:n, WordSense Disambiguationin uuden monitoimialueen arviointivertailun. Tarkemmin sanottuna otamme käyttöön kehyksen Target Sense Verification of Words in Context, joka perustuu sen ainutlaatuiseen muotoiluun binääriluokittelutehtävään, joten se on riippumaton ulkoisista aistiinventoinneista ja eri toimialueiden kattavuudesta. Tämä tekee aineistosta erittäin joustavan erilaisten mallien ja järjestelmien arviointiin toimialoilla ja niiden välillä. WiC-TSV tarjoaa kolme erilaista arviointiasetusta mallissa annettujen tulosignaalien mukaan. Määritimme aineistolle perustason suorituskyvyn käyttäen viimeisimpiä kielimalleja. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että vaikka nämä mallit pystyvät suoriutumaan tehtävässä kunnollisesti, koneen ja ihmisen suorituskyvyn välillä on edelleen aukko, erityisesti toimialueen ulkopuolisissa asetuksissa. WiC-TSV-tiedot ovat saatavilla osoitteessa https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim WiC-TSV, një normë të re për vlerësimin e shumë domeneve për zhdukjen e kuptimit të fjalës. Më specifikisht, ne futim një kuadër për Verifikimin e Fjalëve me Sinqeritet të Objektivit në Kontekst që bazon unikësinë e saj në formulimin si detyrë klasifikimi binar duke qenë kështu i pavarur nga inventaret e ndjenjave të jashtme, dhe mbulimin e domeneve të ndryshme. Kjo e bën grupin e të dhënave shumë fleksibel për vlerësimin e një grupi të ndryshëm modelesh dhe sistemesh në dhe nëpër fusha. WiC-TSV ofron tre rregullime të ndryshme vlerësimi, në varësi të sinjaleve të hyrjes që i jepen modelit. Ne vendosim paraqitjen bazë në grupin e të dhënave duke përdorur modele gjuhësh më të moderne. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se edhe pse këto modele mund të funksionojnë mirë në detyrë, mbetet një dalje midis performancës së makinës dhe njerëzve, veçanërisht në rregullime jashtë domenit. WiC-TSV të dhënat janë në dispozicion në https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo vam WiC-TSV, novo referenčno vrednotenje več področij za Word Sense Disambiguation. Natančneje, predstavljamo okvir za preverjanje besed v kontekstu ciljnega smisla, ki utemeljuje svojo edinstvenost pri formulaciji kot naloga binarne klasifikacije, s čimer je neodvisna od zunanjih zalog pomena in pokritosti različnih področij. Zaradi tega je nabor podatkov zelo prilagodljiv za ocenjevanje različnih modelov in sistemov na in med njimi. WiC-TSV zagotavlja tri različne nastavitve ocenjevanja, odvisno od vhodnih signalov modela. Na naboru podatkov smo določili osnovno uspešnost z uporabo najsodobnejših jezikovnih modelov. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da kljub temu, da lahko ti modeli opravijo dostojno, ostaja vrzel med zmogljivostjo stroja in človeka, zlasti v zunajdomenskih nastavitvah. Podatki WiC-TSV so na voljo na spletni strani https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da WiC-TSV, wata yanzu qiymati na multi-Domen More specifically, we introduce a framework for Target Sense Verification of Words in Context which grounds its uniqueness in the formulation as binary classification task thus being independent of external sense inventories, and the coverage of various domains.  Wannan yana kasa amfani da tsarin da aka ƙayyade wasu shiryoyin da shiryoyin ayuka masu cikin da ke guda. WiC-TSV na samar da tsari uku daban-daban evaluation, daidai a kan ayukan ayuka da aka bãyar da shi zuwa shirin ayuka. Suna daidaita mafarin layin bayani kan tsarin da ke amfani da misãlai-state-of-the-art. Matarin jarrabai na nuna cewa, kuma kõ dã waɗannan misãlai za su iya aikata aiki mai kyau, sai yana da wani gaɓa a tsakanin aikin mutum da aikin mutum, hasa'a, cikin tsarin bayani-bayani. KCharselect unicode block name https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.", 'he': 'אנו מציגים WiC-TSV, רמז עריכה חדש במספר תרומות עבור ניתוח חוש מילים. במיוחד יותר, אנו מציגים מסגרת לבדיקת חוש מטרה של מילים בתוך הקונקסט שמבוססת את היחידות שלה בתצורה בתור משימה סיווג בינרי זה הופך את קבוצת הנתונים לגמילה לגמילה להערכה של קבוצת מודלים ומערכות מגוונות בתחומים ובדרך השטחים. Name We set baseline performance on the dataset using state-of-the-art language models.  תוצאות ניסויים מראות שאפילו שהדוגמנים האלה יכולים להפעיל בצורה הגונה במשימה, נשאר הפער בין ההופעה המכונית לבין האדם, במיוחד במסגרות מחוץ לתחום. נתונים WiC- TSV זמינים ב https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'bo': 'We present WiC-TSV, a new multi-domain evaluation benchmark for Word Sense Disambiguation. More specifically, we introduce a framework for Target Sense Verification of Words in Context which grounds its uniqueness in the formulation as binary classification task thus being independent of external sense inventories, and the coverage of various domains. འདིས་མ་དབྱེ་བ་དང་མ་ལག་གི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ལ་ཆུང་སྤྱིར་བཏུབ་པ་ཡིན་པས་སྣ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཡིག་གི་དཔེ་ལེན་འཐབ་རྩ WiC-TSV provides three different evaluation settings, depending on the input signals provided to the model. ང་ཚོས་སྒྲིག་ཡིག་ཆའི་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་ཚད་གཞི་རྩལ་བ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་གཞི་རྟེན་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པ ལག་ལེན་པའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་དག་དེ་དག་གཟུགས་རིས་ལྟར་འགྲོ་བ་ཡིན་ནའང་། མ་ལག་དང་མིའི་སྒྲུབ་སྟངས་བར་སྟོང་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ་རྟོགས། WiC-TSV སྤྱོད་ཚར་བ https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.', 'jv': 'We present WiC-T SV, a new multi-domain measuremention bench for Word Sense disabled. Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem kanggo TarGet Sense Verification Iki lak akeh dataset sing akeh luwih apik kanggo ngedepalasi sistem sing sampeyan karo model lan sistem sing gak penting sak duluran. WiC-T-SV ngewehke telu kaliwat assertion text-tool-action Peringatan sing paling nggambar na model iki dadi iso nggawe akeh deweke nggawe barang karo sistem lan akeh barang sampeyan karo perbudhakan sampeyan, supoyo iso nggawe out-of-domain. undo-type https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/23683.'}
{'en': 'Self-Supervised and Controlled Multi-Document Opinion Summarization', 'ar': 'تلخيص رأي متعدد المستندات خاضع للإشراف الذاتي والرقابة', 'fr': "Synthèse d'opinion multi-documents auto-supervisée et contrôlée", 'es': 'Resumen de opinión autosupervisado y controlado de varios documentos', 'pt': 'Resumo de opinião em vários documentos autossupervisionados e controlados', 'zh': '自督制之多文档意见总结', 'ja': '自主監督および統制型マルチドキュメント意見の要約', 'hi': 'स्व-पर्यवेक्षित और नियंत्रित बहु-दस्तावेज़ राय सारांशीकरण', 'ru': 'Самоконтролируемое и контролируемое обобщение мнений по нескольким документам', 'ga': 'Achoimre ar Thuairim Ildoiciméad Féinmhaoirsithe agus Rialaithe', 'hu': 'Önfelügyelet és ellenőrzés alatt álló többdokumentumos vélemény összefoglalása', 'it': 'Sintesi del parere multi-documento auto-supervisionato e controllato', 'ka': 'მრავალე დოკუმენტის შესახებ', 'el': 'Αυτοεποπτευόμενη και ελεγχόμενη περίληψη γνώμης πολλών εγγράφων', 'mk': 'Самонадгледувана и контролирана резултата на мислењето на повеќе документи', 'lt': 'Savarankiškai prižiūrima ir kontroliuojama daugiadokumentė nuomonės santrauka', 'ms': 'Penapisan Opsyen Berberapa Dokumen Dipengawasi dan Dikawal Sendiri', 'ml': 'സ്വയം പരിശോധിക്കപ്പെടുത്തുകയും നിയന്ത്രിക്കപ്പെടുത്തുകയും ചെയ്ത പല രേഖയുടെ ഒപ്പിനിയന്\u200d ചുരുക്കം', 'mn': 'Өөрийгөө Хэрэглэгдсэн, Хэрэглэгдсэн олон баримт ойлголтын нийтлэл', 'no': 'Samandringa for fleire dokument-opplysningar med sjølvoversikt og kontrollert', 'kk': 'Өзіңізді бақылау және контроллеу көп құжаттың ақпараттарының тұжырымдамасы', 'mt': 'Sommarju tal-Opinjoni Multi-Dokumenti Awto-Sorveljati u Kontrollati', 'si': 'ස්වාම්ප්\u200dරධාන සහ පාලනය කරලා ගොඩක් ලිපින්ත විශ්වාස සංවේදනය', 'ro': 'Rezumatul avizului multidocument auto-supravegheat și controlat', 'pl': 'Podsumowanie opinii wielokumentowych pod własnym nadzorem i kontrolą', 'so': 'Summariska qofka madax-u-ilaaliyey iyo la controlay', 'sr': 'Самонадзорена и контролирана суммарификация многих документа', 'ta': 'தன்னியக்க பரிசோதிக்கப்பட்ட மற்றும் கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்ட பல ஆவணங்கள் துவக்க சுருக்கம்', 'ur': 'اپنے اوپر نظر کیا گیا اور کنٹرول کیا گیا بہت سی دفتروں کی نظر جمع کرنا', 'sv': 'Sammanfattning av självövervakade och kontrollerade yttranden i flera dokument', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Bản xét xuất sắc và điều khiển', 'bg': 'Обобщение на многодокументалното становище под самонадзор и контролирано', 'nl': 'Zelftoezicht en gecontroleerde opiniesamenvatting uit meerdere documenten', 'hr': 'Sažetak mišljenja o samoopraćenim i kontroliranim mnogobrojnim dokumentima', 'da': 'Selvtilsynet og kontrolleret udtalelse i flere dokumenter resumé', 'id': 'Self-Supervised and Controlled Multi-Document Opinion Summarization', 'ko': '자기 감독 및 제어의 다중 문서 의견 요약', 'fa': 'تعداد نظر خیلی سند خود را تحت نظر و کنترل کند', 'de': 'Self-Supervised und Controlled Multi-Document Opinion Summarisation', 'sq': 'Summarizimi i opinionit me shumë dokumente të mbikqyrur dhe të kontrolluar', 'tr': 'Otomatik Bejerilen we Kontrol Birden Sened Nişanlary', 'sw': 'Ujumbe wa Udhibiti wa Sheria nyingi', 'af': 'Selfbeheer en Kontroleerde Multi- Document Opinion Opsomming', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Ինքնավերահսկված և վերահսկված բազմաթիվ փաստաթղթերի կարծիքների համառոտագրությունը', 'az': 'Öz-təhlükəsizlik və Kontrolləndirilən çoxlu Dəstə Gözləri Toplaşdırma', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভিস্ট এবং নিয়ন্ত্রণিত বহুনথী সামারিজেশন', 'bs': 'Samovršeno nadzirano i kontrolirano sažetak mišljenja o mnogim dokumentima', 'ca': "Resumen de l'opinió sobre múltiples documents autosupervisades i controlades", 'cs': 'Samozřejmě kontrolované a vícedokumentové shrnutí stanoviska', 'et': 'Enesejärelevalve all ja kontrollitava mitmekordse arvamuse kokkuvõte', 'fi': 'Itsevalvottu ja valvottu usean asiakirjan lausuntotiivistelmä', 'jv': 'Sampeyan Gak-Njuasan Karo Multi-Dokumen Senegal', 'sk': 'Povzetek mnenja z več dokumenti, ki se samonadzoruje in nadzoruje', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'סדרת דעת מסמכים רבים ששולטת על עצמה', 'bo': 'རང་ཉིད་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ་དང་ཚད་འཛིན་བྱེད་པའི་ཡིག་ཆ་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་བསམ་ཚུལ་བསྡུས།'}
{'en': 'We address the problem of unsupervised abstractive summarization of collections of user generated reviews through self-supervision and control. We propose a self-supervised setup that considers an individual document as a target summary for a set of similar documents. This setting makes training simpler than previous approaches by relying only on standard log-likelihood loss and mainstream models. We address the problem of hallucinations through the use of control codes, to steer the generation towards more coherent and relevant summaries.', 'ar': 'نعالج مشكلة التلخيص التجريدي غير الخاضع للرقابة لمجموعات المراجعات التي ينشئها المستخدمون من خلال الإشراف الذاتي والرقابة. نقترح إعدادًا خاضعًا للإشراف الذاتي يعتبر مستندًا فرديًا كملخص مستهدف لمجموعة من المستندات المماثلة. هذا الإعداد يجعل التدريب أبسط من الأساليب السابقة من خلال الاعتماد فقط على فقدان احتمالية السجل القياسي والنماذج السائدة. نعالج مشكلة الهلوسة من خلال استخدام أكواد التحكم ، لتوجيه الجيل نحو ملخصات أكثر تماسكًا وذات صلة.', 'es': 'Abordamos el problema de la sumarización abstractiva no supervisada de las colecciones de reseñas generadas por los usuarios a través de la autosupervisión y el control. Proponemos una configuración autosupervisada que considera un documento individual como un resumen objetivo para un conjunto de documentos similares. Esta configuración hace que la capacitación sea más simple que los enfoques anteriores al basarse únicamente en los modelos estándar de pérdida de probabilidad logarítmica y convencionales. Abordamos el problema de las alucinaciones mediante el uso de códigos de control, para dirigir a la generación hacia resúmenes más coherentes y relevantes.', 'pt': 'Abordamos o problema da sumarização abstrativa não supervisionada de coleções de avaliações geradas por usuários por meio de autosupervisão e controle. Propomos uma configuração autossupervisionada que considera um documento individual como um resumo de destino para um conjunto de documentos semelhantes. Essa configuração torna o treinamento mais simples do que as abordagens anteriores, contando apenas com perda de probabilidade de log padrão e modelos convencionais. Abordamos o problema das alucinações através do uso de códigos de controle, para direcionar a geração para resumos mais coerentes e relevantes.', 'fr': "Nous abordons le problème de la synthèse abstraite non supervisée de collections d'avis générés par les utilisateurs grâce à l'auto-supervision et au contrôle. Nous proposons une configuration auto-supervisée qui considère un document individuel comme un résumé cible pour un ensemble de documents similaires. Ce paramètre simplifie la formation par rapport aux approches précédentes en s'appuyant uniquement sur la perte de vraisemblance logarithmique standard et les modèles courants. Nous abordons le problème des hallucinations grâce à l'utilisation de codes de contrôle, afin d'orienter la génération vers des résumés plus cohérents et plus pertinents.", 'ja': '私たちは、自己監督と管理を通じて、ユーザーが作成したレビューのコレクションを監督なしで抽象的に要約する問題に取り組んでいます。個々のドキュメントを一連の類似ドキュメントのターゲットサマリーとして考慮した自主監督型の設定を提案します。この設定は、標準的な対数損失および主流モデルのみに依存することで、以前のアプローチよりもトレーニングを簡単にします。私たちは、制御コードを使用して幻覚の問題に対処し、世代をより一貫性のある関連性のある要約に導きます。', 'zh': '自监制用户成论集者无监摘要。 臣等议用自督设,以单文档为类文档者摘要。 此所以依准对数似然损及主流,使训练简于前法。 吾以制代码决幻,导生贯摘要。', 'ru': 'Мы решаем проблему неконтролируемого абстрактного обобщения коллекций пользовательских отзывов посредством самоконтроля и контроля. Мы предлагаем самоконтролируемую схему, которая рассматривает отдельный документ в качестве целевого резюме для набора аналогичных документов. Эта настройка упрощает обучение по сравнению с предыдущими подходами, полагаясь только на стандартные логарифмические потери правдоподобия и основные модели. Мы решаем проблему галлюцинаций с помощью контрольных кодов, с тем чтобы направлять генерации к более последовательным и актуальным резюме.', 'hi': 'हम स्व-पर्यवेक्षण और नियंत्रण के माध्यम से उपयोगकर्ता द्वारा उत्पन्न समीक्षाओं के संग्रह के असुरक्षित अमूर्त सारांश की समस्या को संबोधित करते हैं। हम एक स्व-पर्यवेक्षित सेटअप का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो समान दस्तावेजों के एक सेट के लिए एक व्यक्तिगत दस्तावेज़ को लक्ष्य सारांश के रूप में मानता है। यह सेटिंग केवल मानक लॉग-संभावना हानि और मुख्यधारा के मॉडल पर भरोसा करके पिछले दृष्टिकोणों की तुलना में प्रशिक्षण को सरल बनाती है। हम नियंत्रण कोड के उपयोग के माध्यम से मतिभ्रम की समस्या को संबोधित करते हैं, पीढ़ी को अधिक सुसंगत और प्रासंगिक सारांश की ओर ले जाने के लिए।', 'ga': 'Tugaimid aghaidh ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le hachoimriú teibí gan mhaoirseacht ar bhailiúcháin léirmheasanna arna nginiúint ag úsáideoirí trí fhéinmhaoirseacht agus rialú. Molaimid socrú féin-mhaoirsithe a bhreathnaíonn ar dhoiciméad aonair mar achoimre sprice do thacar doiciméad comhchosúil. Déanann an socrú seo an oiliúint níos simplí ná cuir chuige roimhe seo trí bheith ag brath ar mhúnlaí caighdeánacha caillteanas dóchúlachta logála agus ar mhúnlaí príomhshrutha amháin. Tugaimid aghaidh ar fhadhb na siabhránachtaí trí úsáid a bhaint as cóid rialaithe, chun an ghlúin a stiúradh i dtreo achoimrí níos soiléire agus níos ábhartha.', 'hu': 'A felhasználók által generált értékelések gyűjteményeinek felügyelet nélküli absztrakt összefoglalásának problémáját önfelügyeleten és ellenőrzésen keresztül kezeljük. Javasolunk egy önfelügyelt beállítást, amely az egyes dokumentumokat hasonló dokumentumok célösszefoglalójának tekinti. Ez a beállítás egyszerűbbé teszi a képzést a korábbi megközelítéseknél azáltal, hogy csak a standard log-valószínűségi veszteségre és a mainstream modellekre támaszkodik. A hallucinációk problémáját kontrollkódok használatával foglalkozunk, hogy a generációt koherensebb és relevánsabb összefoglalók felé irányítsuk.', 'el': 'Αντιμετωπίζουμε το πρόβλημα της άνευ επίβλεψης αφηρημένης σύνοψης συλλογών κριτικών που δημιουργούνται από χρήστες μέσω αυτοεπίβλεψης και ελέγχου. Προτείνουμε μια αυτοεποπτική ρύθμιση που θεωρεί ένα μεμονωμένο έγγραφο ως μια περίληψη στόχων για ένα σύνολο παρόμοιων εγγράφων. Αυτή η ρύθμιση καθιστά την εκπαίδευση απλούστερη από τις προηγούμενες προσεγγίσεις, βασιζόμενος μόνο σε τυποποιημένα μοντέλα απώλειας πιθανοτήτων καταγραφής και σε βασικά μοντέλα. Αντιμετωπίζουμε το πρόβλημα των παραισθήσεων μέσω της χρήσης κωδικών ελέγχου, προκειμένου να κατευθύνουμε τη γενιά προς πιο συνεκτικές και σχετικές περιλήψεις.', 'it': "Affrontiamo il problema della sintesi astratta non supervisionata delle raccolte di recensioni generate dagli utenti attraverso auto-supervisione e controllo. Proponiamo un setup auto-supervisionato che considera un singolo documento come un riassunto di destinazione per una serie di documenti simili. Questa impostazione rende la formazione più semplice rispetto agli approcci precedenti, basandosi solo su modelli standard di perdita di probabilità di log e tradizionali. Affrontiamo il problema delle allucinazioni attraverso l'uso di codici di controllo, per orientare la generazione verso riassunti più coerenti e pertinenti.", 'lt': 'Mes sprendžiame problem ą, susijusią su nepastebima abstrakčia vartotojų sukauptų peržiūrų rinkinių santrauka, atliekant savarankišką priežiūrą ir kontrolę. Siūlome savarankiškai prižiūrėtą struktūrą, kurioje atskiras dokumentas laikomas panašių dokumentų rinkinio tiksline santrauka. Pagal šį nustatymą mokymas paprastesnis nei ankstesni metodai, nes jis grindžiamas tik standartiniais žurnalo tikimybės praradimo ir pagrindiniais modeliais. Mes sprendžiame haliucinacijų problem ą naudojant kontrolės kodus, siekiant nukreipti kartą į nuoseklesnes ir atitinkamas santraukas.', 'kk': 'Біз пайдаланушылардың жиындарының автоқарау және басқару арқылы жазылмаған абстрактивті жиындарының мәселесін шешуіміз. Біз бұл құжатты жеке құжатты ұқсас құжаттардың нақты тұжырымдамасы ретінде қалайтын өзімізді бақылайтын баптауын ұсындық. Бұл параметр тек стандартты журнал мүмкіндігін жоғалтып, негізгі үлгілеріне сеніп, алдыңғы жағдайлардан қарапайым болады. Біз бақылау кодтарын қолдану арқылы халлюзинациялардың мәселелерін, құрылымды көбірек және маңызды тәсілдерге көмектесу үшін көмектесеміз.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ დავწყებთ პრობლემას, რომელიც მომხმარებლის კოლექციების კოლექციაციას, რომელიც შეიქმნა პრობლემა, თავიდან დაახლოებით და კონტროლის ჩვენ მინდომათ თავიდან დავამუშავებული კონფიგურაცია, რომელიც ინდივებულ დოკუმენტის საზოგადომის საზოგადომი დოკუმენტისთვის. ეს შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი დაკავშირება უფრო მარტივია, ვიდრე წინა შესაბამისი შესაბამისი დაკავშირება და სტანდარტრიმის მოდელზე ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ ჰალუცინაციების პრობლემების გამოყენება კონტროლური კოდეების გამოყენებით, რომ უფრო სხვადასხვა და შესაძლებელი კონტროლური კოდეების გადა', 'ml': 'സൂക്ഷിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ സംഘടനയുടെ സംഘടിപ്പിന്റെ പ്രശ്നം നമ്മള്\u200d സ്വയം നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതും നി സ്വയം നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു സജ്ജീകരണത്തെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അത് ഒരു വ്യക്തിക രേഖയെ ഒരു ലക്ഷ്യം  ഈ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d മുമ്പുള്ള പരിശീലനത്തെക്കാള്\u200d എളുപ്പമാക്കുന്നു. സാധാരണ ലോഗ് സാധ്യതയുള്ള നഷ്ടത്തില്\u200d മാത്രമ നിയന്ത്രണക്കുറിപ്പുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിലൂടെ നമ്മുടെ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. തലമുറകളെ കൂടു', 'mk': 'Ние го решаваме проблемот на ненадгледуваната апстрактивна резултат на колекциите на корисниците генерирани рецензии преку самонадзор и контрола. Ние предложуваме самонадгледувано поставување кое смета за индивидуален документ како резултат на целта за множина слични документи. Оваа поставка го направи обуката поедноставна од претходните пристапи со тоа што се потпира само на стандардната загуба на веројатноста на логот и главните модели. Ние го решаваме проблемот на халуцинациите преку употреба на контролни кодови, за да ја управуваме генерацијата кон покохерентни и релевантни резултати.', 'ms': 'Kami mengatasi masalah penglihatan abstraktif tidak diawasi koleksi pengguna jana ulasan melalui pengawasan dan kawalan diri. Kami cadangkan seting yang mengawasi diri yang menganggap dokumen individu sebagai ringkasan sasaran untuk set dokumen yang sama. Tetapan ini membuat latihan lebih mudah daripada pendekatan terdahulu dengan bergantung hanya pada kehilangan log-kemungkinan piawai dan model aliran utama. Kami mengatasi masalah halusinasi melalui menggunakan kod kawalan, untuk memimpin generasi ke arah ringkasan yang lebih konsisten dan relevan.', 'no': 'Vi opprettar problemet med usikkerte abstraktive samansering av samlingar av brukaren genererte gjennom sjølvovervaking og kontroll. Vi foreslår ein sjølvovervåke oppsett som ser på eit individuell dokument som eit målsamning for eit sett av liknande dokument. Denne innstillinga gjer opplæring enklare enn tidlegare tilnærmingar ved å berre tilbakekalla standardmodeller for loggsannsynligheten og vanleg modeller. Vi handler problemet med halusinasjonar gjennom bruk av kontrollkode, for å styra generasjonen til meir koherent og relevante samandrag.', 'ro': 'Rezolvăm problema rezumatului abstractiv nesupravegheat al colecțiilor de recenzii generate de utilizatori prin auto-supraveghere și control. Propunem o configurație auto-supravegheată care consideră un document individual ca rezumat țintă pentru un set de documente similare. Această setare face instruirea mai simplă decât abordările anterioare, bazându-se numai pe pierderea probabilității logului standard și pe modelele principale. Abordăm problema halucinațiilor prin utilizarea codurilor de control, pentru a direcționa generația către rezumate mai coerente și relevante.', 'sr': 'Mi rješavamo problem neodređenog abstraktivnog sažetka kolekcija korisnika koji su proizveli preglede kroz samopouzdanje i kontrolu. Predlažemo samoopraćenu postavku koja smatra individualnim dokumentom kao ciljni sažetak za skup sličnih dokumenta. Ovaj nastav čini obuku jednostavnijim od prethodnih pristupa, pouzdajući se samo na standardni gubitak verovatnosti dnevnika i glavni modeli. Mi rješavamo problem halucinacija kroz korištenje kontrolnih kodova, da vodimo generaciju ka saskaņotnijim i relevantnim sažetkama.', 'mt': 'Aħna nindirizzaw il-problema ta’ sommarju astrattiv mhux sorveljat tal-kollezzjonijiet ta’ reviżjonijiet iġġenerati mill-utenti permezz ta’ awtosorveljanza u kontroll. Aħna nipproponu struttura awtosorveljata li tikkunsidra dokument individwali bħala sommarju fil-mira għal sett ta’ dokumenti simili. Dan l-istabbiliment jagħmel it-taħriġ aktar sempliċi minn approċċi preċedenti billi jiddependi biss fuq it-telf standard tal-probabbiltà tar-reġistrazzjoni u l-mudelli prinċipali. We address the problem of hallucinations through the use of control codes, to steer the generation towards more coherent and relevant summaries.', 'mn': 'Бид хэрэглэгчийн цуглуулалтыг өөрийгөө удирдлагаар, удирдлагаар шинжилгээ үүсгэдэг хэмжээсүүдийн асуудлыг шийдвэрлэх болно. Бид өөрсдийгөө удирдаж буй бүтээгдэхүүнийг төстэй баримтуудын төлөвлөгөө гэж үздэг өөрсдийгөө удирдаж буй байгууллага сануулдаг. Энэ тохиолдол нь өмнөх арга барилгуудаас илүү хялбар болгож, зөвхөн стандарт лог магадлалын алдагдал болон ихэвчлэн загваруудын загварууд дээр итгэдэг. Бид хүүхдүүдийг удирдлагын кодыг ашиглаж, улс төрөлхтөн илүү хамааралтай, холбоотой жишээлүүдийг удирддаг.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධකයාගේ සම්බන්ධකයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා ස්වාම්බන්ධකය සහ පාලනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ අපි ස්වයංග්\u200dරහයක් පරීක්ෂා කරපු සැකසුමක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකෘත ලිපිණිපතියක් වගේ ලක්ෂ මේ සැකසුම් ප්\u200dරධානය කලින් ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධානය සහ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධානයක් නැති විතරයි. අපි හැලුසිනස් වල ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා පාලනය කෝඩ් වලට ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න, ප්\u200dරශ්නය විශ', 'sv': 'Vi tar itu med problemet med oövervakad abstraktiv sammanfattning av samlingar av användargenererade recensioner genom självövervakning och kontroll. Vi föreslår en självövervakad installation som betraktar ett enskilt dokument som en målsammanfattning för en uppsättning liknande dokument. Den här inställningen gör träningen enklare än tidigare metoder genom att enbart förlita sig på standardloggsannolikhetsförluster och vanliga modeller. Vi tar itu med problemet med hallucinationer genom att använda kontrollkoder, för att styra generationen mot mer sammanhängande och relevanta sammanfattningar.', 'so': 'We address the problem of unsupervised abstractive summarization of collections of user generated reviews through self-supervision and control.  Waxaannu soo jeedaynaa qoraal ilaaliya oo u fiirinaya dukumenti qof oo gaar ah, kaas oo u eg qoraal lamid ah. Xaruntan waxbarashadu way ka fududaysaa hababka hore, taas oo kaliya ku rajaynaya khasaarada saxda ah iyo tusaalaha ugu horeeya. Dhibaatada hallaynta waxaynu kala sheekaynaa isticmaalka codsiga maamulka, si aan u hogaajinno qarniga oo u jeedo xagaaga badan oo la xiriira.', 'pl': 'Zajmujemy się problemem nienadzorowanej abstrakcyjnej streszczenia zbiorów recenzji generowanych przez użytkowników poprzez samoobsługę i kontrolę. Proponujemy samodzielną konfigurację, która traktuje indywidualny dokument jako docelowe podsumowanie dla zestawu podobnych dokumentów. Ustawienie to sprawia, że szkolenie jest prostsze niż poprzednie podejścia, polegając wyłącznie na standardowych modelach utraty prawdopodobieństwa logowania i głównym nurcie. Zajmujemy się problemem halucynacji poprzez stosowanie kodów kontrolnych, aby kierować generację w kierunku bardziej spójnych i odpowiednich streszczeń.', 'ta': 'பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத செயல்படுத்தப்படாத சுருக்கத்தின் பிரச்சினையை நாம் விளக்குகிறோம் பயனர் தொகுப்புகளின் சேர் நாம் ஒரு தனிப்பட்ட ஆவணத்தை ஒரு சுருக்கமாக கருதும் ஒரு சில போன்ற ஆவணங்களுக்கு ஒரு சுருக்கம் என்று நினைக்கிறோம். இந்த அமைப்பு முந்தைய வழிகளை விட பயிற்சியை எளிதாக்குகிறது நிலையான பதிவு சாத்தியமான இழப்பு மற்றும் முக்கிய ம நாம் பிரச்சனையை நிர்ணயிக்க, கட்டுப்பாட்டு குறியீடுகளை பயன்படுத்தும் மூலம் பிரச்சனைகளை நேர்வழி செய்கிறோம்,', 'ur': 'ہم اس مسئلہ سے مشکل کریں گے جو استعمال کے مجموعے کی غیر قابل تحقیق اور کنٹرول کے ذریعہ سے آزمائش پیدا کیا گیا ہے۔ ہم ایک سٹم کی نظارت کرنے والی سٹاپ کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو ایک شخصی دکھانے کو ایک طرح کے دکھانے کے لئے موجود ترکیب کے طور پر سمجھتا ہے. This setting makes training simpler than previous approaches by only relying on standard log-likelihood loss and mainstream models. ہم کانٹرول کوڈ کے استعمال کے ذریعے ہلوسینال کے مسئلہ سے مشکل کریں گے، اس لئے کہ نسل کو اس سے زیادہ مشکل اور مشکل ترکیب کی طرف چلائیں۔', 'uz': "Biz saqlanmagan abstractiv hisoblanuvchi muammolarni boshqarish va o'zimni boshqarish orqali foydalanuvchilar tuzuvchisi yaratiladi. Biz quyidagi narsalarni bir xil hujjatning bir bir xil hujjatning muhit deb hisoblash mumkin. @ info: whatsthis Biz tashkilotlarni boshqarish qoidalari yordamida boshqarish muammolarini boshqaramiz, avval bir necha xil va muhim muhim muhimda boshqarish uchun.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giải quyết vấn đề về việc tổng kết thu nhỏ không giám sát các tập hợp của các người dùng qua tự giám sát và kiểm soát. Chúng tôi đề xuất một thiết lập tự giám sát xem một tài liệu cá nhân là một bản tóm tắt đích đến cho một loạt tài liệu tương tự. Thiết lập này sẽ làm đào tạo đơn giản hơn các phương pháp trước bằng cách dựa vào khả năng giảm tỷ lệ đăng ký tiêu chuẩn và mẫu chính thống. Chúng ta giải quyết vấn đề ảo giác bằng cách dùng mật mã điều khiển, hướng dẫn thế hệ đến các mô hình liên quan và liên quan hơn.', 'bg': 'Разглеждаме проблема с ненадзорното абстрактно обобщаване на колекциите от потребителски рецензии чрез самонаблюдение и контрол. Предлагаме самостоятелно контролирана настройка, която разглежда отделен документ като целево резюме за набор от подобни документи. Тази настройка прави обучението по-лесно от предишните подходи, като разчита само на стандартните логови загуби и основните модели. Ние решаваме проблема с халюцинациите чрез използването на контролни кодове, за да насочим поколението към по-съгласувани и подходящи резюмета.', 'da': 'Vi løser problemet med uautoriseret abstrakt sammenfatning af samlinger af brugergenererede anmeldelser gennem selvtilsyn og kontrol. Vi foreslår en selvovervåget opsætning, der betragter et individuelt dokument som et målresumé for et sæt lignende dokumenter. Denne indstilling gør træning enklere end tidligere tilgange ved kun at stole på standard log-sandsynlighedstab og mainstream modeller. Vi løser problemet med hallucinationer ved hjælp af kontrolkoder for at styre produktionen mod mere sammenhængende og relevante resuméer.', 'nl': 'We pakken het probleem van de abstracte samenvatting van verzamelingen van door gebruikers gegenereerde reviews aan door zelftoezicht en controle. We stellen een self-supervised setup voor die een individueel document beschouwt als een doelsamenvatting voor een reeks soortgelijke documenten. Deze instelling maakt training eenvoudiger dan eerdere benaderingen door alleen te vertrouwen op standaard log-waarschijnlijkheidsverlies en mainstream modellen. We pakken het probleem van hallucinaties aan door middel van controlecodes, om de generatie te sturen naar meer samenhangende en relevante samenvattingen.', 'hr': 'Mi rješavamo problem neodređenog abstraktivnog sažetka kolekcija korisnika proizvedenih pregleda kroz samoopraćenje i kontrolu. Predlažemo samoopraćenu postavku koja smatra pojedinačnim dokumentom kao ciljni sažetak za skup sličnih dokumenta. Ovaj nastav čini obuku jednostavnijim od prethodnih pristupa, pouzdajući se samo na standardni gubitak vjerojatnosti dnevnika i glavni modeli. Mi rješavamo problem halucinacija kroz korištenje kontrolnih kodova, upravljati generacijom ka saskaņotnijim i relevantnim sažetkama.', 'de': 'Wir adressieren das Problem der unbeaufsichtigten abstrakten Zusammenfassung von Sammlungen von nutzergenerierten Bewertungen durch Selbstüberwachung und Kontrolle. Wir schlagen ein selbstüberwachtes Setup vor, das ein einzelnes Dokument als Zielzusammenfassung für eine Reihe ähnlicher Dokumente betrachtet. Diese Einstellung vereinfacht das Training als frühere Ansätze, da sich nur auf Standard-Log-Likelihood Loss und Mainstream-Modelle stützt. Wir adressieren das Problem der Halluzinationen durch den Einsatz von Kontrollcodes, um die Generierung zu kohärenteren und relevanteren Zusammenfassungen zu lenken.', 'fa': 'ما مشکل ذخیره\u200cسازی غیرقابل استفاده از جمع\u200cآوری\u200cهای استفاده از طریق نظارت و کنترل خودخواهی تولید کرده\u200cایم. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک تنظیمات تحت نظر خود که یک سند شخصی را به عنوان یک جمع هدف برای مجموعه از سند مشابه به نظر می\u200cآید. این تنظیم آموزش را از دستورات قبلی ساده\u200cتر می\u200cسازد با توجه به خسارت احتمال لیگ و مدل\u200cهای اصلی استاندارد. ما با استفاده از کدهای کنترل مشکل هالوسیژن ها را با استفاده از کدهای کنترل حل می کنیم تا نسل را به سوی جمعیت های مشترک و مربوط تر هدایت کنیم.', 'sw': 'Tunaongelea tatizo la uangalizi usio na uhakika wa ufumbuzi wa mkusanyiko wa mtumiaji uliotengeneza tafiti kupitia uangalizi na udhibiti. Tunaendelea kuanzishwa kwa kujitahadharisha kwa ajili ya makundi kama hayo. Mpango huu unafanya mafunzo rahisi zaidi ya mbinu zilizopita kwa kutegemea tu kwa uwezekano wa kupoteza kwa ajili ya kujilogu na mifano makubwa. Tunaongelea tatizo la kutambuliwa kupitia matumizi ya sheria za kudhibiti, kuongoza kizazi kinachoelekea kwa kiangazi kikubwa zaidi na kinachohusiana.', 'id': 'Kami mengatasi masalah penglihatan abstraktif tidak diawasi koleksi pengguna yang dihasilkan resensi melalui pengawasan dan kontrol diri. Kami mengusulkan seting yang diawasi sendiri yang menganggap dokumen individu sebagai ringkasan sasaran untuk set dokumen yang sama. Seting ini membuat pelatihan lebih mudah dari pendekatan sebelumnya dengan bergantung hanya pada kehilangan log-kemungkinan standar dan model mainstream. Kami mengatasi masalah halusinasi melalui menggunakan kode kontrol, untuk mengarahkan generasi ke arah ringkasan yang lebih konsisten dan relevan.', 'ko': '우리는 자가 감독과 제어를 통해 사용자가 평론 집합을 생성하는 무감독 추상적 요약 문제를 해결한다.우리는 하나의 문서를 유사한 문서의 목표 요약으로 간주하는 자체 감독 설정을 제시했다.표준 대수 유사 손실과 주류 모델에만 의존함으로써 이런 설정을 통해 훈련은 이전의 방법보다 더욱 간단해졌다.우리는 제어 코드를 사용하여 환각 문제를 해결하고 한 세대를 더욱 일관되고 관련 있는 총결로 이끌었다.', 'af': "Ons adres die probleem van onverondersteunde abstraktiewe opsomming van samlings van gebruiker genereerde resensies deur self-supervisie en kontrole. Ons voorstel 'n self-superviseer opstelling wat 'n individuele dokument as 'n doel opsomming vir' n stel van soortgelyke dokumente aanneem. Hierdie opstelling maak onderwerp eenvoudiger as vorige toegang deur slegs te vertrou op standaard log-likeliteit verlies en onderwerp modele. Ons adres die probleem van hallusinasies deur die gebruik van beheer kodes om die generasie te steer na meer koherente en relevante opsommings.", 'tr': 'Ullançylaryň özüni gözezçilik we kontrol bilen döredilen çykyşlaryň soňky hasaplamasynyň problemasyny çözýäris. Bir sened beýleki sened üçin bir maksady hökmünde gözleýän bir düzümlerni teklip edip görýäris. Bu düzümler diňe bellenen gündelik ýitirmek we bellenen nusgalara ynanýarak öňki ýarymlardan has aňsatlyk bilen öňki ýarymlardan has gowurak edýär. Biz halucinasyonlar kynçylygyny kontrol kodlaryny kullanarak, jenerasyony biraz daha uyumlu ve relemli toplamlara yönetmek üçin çözeriz.', 'sq': 'Ne trajtojmë problemin e përmbledhjes abstrakte të mbledhjeve të shqyrtimeve të përdoruesve nëpërmjet vetëmbikqyrjes dhe kontrollit. Ne propozojmë një strukturë vetëmbikqyrur që konsideron një dokument individual ë si një përmbledhje objektive për një sërë dokumentesh të ngjashme. Ky rregullim e bën trajnimin më të thjeshtë se qasjet e mëparshme duke u mbështetur vetëm në humbjen e mundësive standarte të logaritmit dhe modelet kryesore. Ne trajtojmë problemin e halucinacioneve nëpërmjet përdorimit të kodeve të kontrollit, për të drejtuar gjeneratën drejt përmbledhjeve më koherente dhe të rëndësishme.', 'az': 'Biz özünüzü gözləyir və kontrol vasitəsilə yaratdığı istifadəçilərin koleksiyonların istifadəçi olmayan abstraktiv qismini çəkirik. Biz özünüzü gözləyirik bir qurğu təklif edirik ki, bəzisi bir dökümə bənzər dökümlər üçün nişan qurğu kimi hesab edir. Bu təhsil, əvvəlki təhsillərdən çox asanlaşdırır, ancaq standart log-likeliğinin zərəri və mainstream modellərə təvəkkül edərək. Biz halucinasyonların problemlərini kontrol kodlarının istifadəsi ilə çəkirik, nəslini daha münasibətli və münasibətli toplamlara yönəltmək üçün.', 'hy': 'Մենք լուծում ենք օգտագործողների հավաքածուների անվերահսկված վերացական համառոտագրության խնդիրը, որը ստեղծվում է ինքնավերահսկողության և վերահսկողության միջոցով: We propose a self-supervised setup that considers an individual document as a target summary for a set of similar documents.  Այս սահմանափակումն ավելի պարզ է դարձնում ուսումնասիրությունը, քան նախորդ մոտեցումները, հիմնվելով միայն ստանդարտ լոգ-հավանականության կորստի և հիմնական մոդելների վրա: Մենք լուծում ենք հալյուցինացիաների խնդիրը վերահսկողական կոդների օգտագործման միջոցով, որպեսզի առաջնորդում ենք սերունդը ավելի համապատասխան և հարմար համառոտագրությունների ուղղությամբ:', 'am': 'በተጠበቀው ስብስብሰባ የተደረገውን የጥያቄውን ጉዳይ በራሱ ላይ እና በመቆጣጠር እናስቀራለን፡፡ የአንድ ሰው ሰነድ አቃራቢ እንዲሆን የሚያስፈልገውን የራሳቸውን የተጠበቀውን ቁጥጥር እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ይሄ ማስተካከል የቀድሞው ደረጃዎች ከመጀመሪያው ደረጃዎች ይልቅ ትምህርት ማድረግ ቀላል ነው፡፡ ትውልዱን በተጨማሪና በተጠቃሚ ጉዳይ ለመቀበል እናስቸጋራለን፡፡', 'cs': 'Řešíme problém bez dohledu abstraktivního shrnutí sbírek uživatelských recenzí prostřednictvím sebeohledu a kontroly. Navrhujeme samostatné nastavení, které považuje jednotlivý dokument za cílové shrnutí pro sadu podobných dokumentů. Toto nastavení usnadňuje trénink než předchozí přístupy tím, že se spoléhá pouze na standardní ztráty pravděpodobnosti protokolu a hlavní modely. Problém halucinací řešíme pomocí kontrolních kódů, abychom nasměrovali generaci k soudržnějším a relevantnějším shrnutím.', 'ca': "Ens ocupem del problema de la resumida abstracta sense supervisió de les col·leccions de revisions generades per l'usuari a través de l'autosupervisió i el control. Proposem una configuració auto-supervisada que considera un document individual com un resum objectiu d'un conjunt de documents semblants. Aquesta configuració fa la formació més senzilla que els enfocaments anteriors només basant-se en la pèrdua de probabilitats de registre i els models principals. Afectem el problema de les alucinacions mitjançant l'ús de codis de control, per dirigir la generació cap a resums més coherents i rellevants.", 'bn': 'ব্যবহারকারীদের সংগ্রহের সংক্ষেপ নিজেদের স্বয়ংক্রান্ত পর্যবেক্ষণ এবং নিয়ন্ত্রণের মাধ্যমে সৃষ্টি করা হয়েছে। আমরা একটি নিজেকে পর্যবেক্ষণ করার প্রস্তাব প্রস্তাব করছি যা একটি ব্যক্তিগত নথিপত্র হিসেবে বিবেচনা করে যায় একই ধরনের নথিপত্রের জন এই বৈশিষ্ট্য প্রশিক্ষণ পূর্ববর্তী পদক্ষেপের চেয়ে সহজ করে শুধুমাত্র স্বাভাবিক লগ-সম্ভাবনার ক্ষতি এবং মূল মডেল We address the problem of hallucinations through the use of control codes, to steer the generation towards more coherent and relevant summaries.', 'et': 'Tegeleme kasutajate loodud arvustuste kogude järelevalveta abstraktse kokkuvõtmise probleemiga enesejärelevalve ja kontrolli kaudu. Pakume välja isejärelevalve seadistuse, mis käsitleb individuaalset dokumenti sarnaste dokumentide sihtkokkuvõttena. See seade muudab koolituse eelmistest lähenemisviisidest lihtsamaks, tuginedes ainult standardsetele logitõenäosuse kaotusele ja tavamudelitele. Me tegeleme hallutsinatsioonide probleemiga kontrollkoodide abil, et suunata põlvkond sidusamate ja asjakohaste kokkuvõtete poole.', 'bs': 'Mi rješavamo problem neodređenog abstraktivnog sažetka kolekcija korisnika koji su proizveli preglede kroz samopouzdanje i kontrolu. Predlažemo samopouzdani uspostav koji smatra pojedinačnim dokumentom kao ciljni sažetak za skup sličnih dokumenta. Ovaj nastav čini obuku jednostavnijim od prethodnih pristupa, pouzdajući se samo na standardni gubitak mogućnosti dnevnika i glavni modeli. Mi rješavamo problem halucinacija kroz korištenje kontrolnih kodova, da vodimo generaciju ka saskaņotnijim i relevantnim sažetcima.', 'fi': 'Käsittelemme käyttäjien tekemien arvostelujen kokoelman valvomattoman abstraktiivisen yhteenvedon ongelmaa itsevalvonnan ja valvonnan avulla. Ehdotamme itsevalvottua kokoonpanoa, joka pitää yksittäisen asiakirjan kohdeyhteenvetona samankaltaisille asiakirjoille. Tämä asetus yksinkertaistaa harjoittelua aikaisempia lähestymistapoja tukemalla vain tavanomaisiin log-todennäköisyystappioihin ja valtavirtamalleihin. Käsittelemme hallusinaatioiden ongelmaa valvontakoodien avulla ohjaamalla sukupolvia kohti johdonmukaisempia ja tarkoituksenmukaisempia yhteenvetoja.', 'ha': "Munã shawarar da matsalar da ba'a tsare shi ba, ƙararin aikin mai amfani da ke samun mutane da suka ƙãga tafarki game da kandina-tsari da Control. Tuna goyyar da tsarin tsari da ke tsare kansa, wanda ke ƙaddara takardar mutum guda kamar wata takardar gabatar da amfani zuwa wani takardun takardun nan da ke daidaita. Wannan daidaita yana kasancẽwa mafiya sauƙi ga amfani da shiryoyin ayuka da aka gabãta, kuma yana dõgara kawai kan tapar-mai yiwuwa na taƙaitaccen log da misãlai masu ƙaranci. Munã shawarar da masu haske da amfani da kodi na Control, domin su shirya kizayen zuwa masu ƙarfafa da masu muhimmi.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé ngerasakno perbudhakan karo hal-perusahaan apa ora ngerasakno dadi nggawe nguterakno Awak dhéwé nggawe aturan sampeyan sampeyan luwih nggawe Dokumen sing wis ngawe tarjamahan kanggo nggawe dolanan dokumen sing ngewehi. Digawe Awak dhéwé mengko perusahaan halusikap ning nguasakno dadi nggawe kode nggawe, nggawe ngubah dunyane seneng beraksi lan sakjane resuran', 'he': 'אנחנו מתמודדים עם הבעיה של סכם אסטרקטיבי ללא השגחה של אוסף של משתמשים מיוצרים ביקורות דרך השגחה עצמית ושליטה. אנו מציעים התקנה שמבוטחת בעצמנו שמחשבה מסמך אישי כסכם מטרה עבור קבוצה של מסמכים דומים. ההגדרה הזאת עושה האימון קל יותר מהגישות הקודמות על ידי הסמוך רק על אובדן סבירות לוג סטנדרטית ודוגמנים ראשיים. אנחנו מתייחסים לבעיה של הזיות באמצעות השימוש בקודי שליטה, כדי להוביל את הדור לכיוון סדרות יותר תואם ורלוונטיות.', 'sk': 'Problem nenadzorovanega abstraktivnega povzemanja zbirk uporabniških recenzij obravnavamo s samonadzorom in kontrolo. Predlagamo samonadzorovano nastavitev, ki posamezni dokument obravnava kot ciljni povzetek za nabor podobnih dokumentov. Ta nastavitev omogoča enostavnejše usposabljanje od prejšnjih pristopov, saj se zanaša samo na standardne izgube verjetnosti log in običajne modele. Problem halucinacij obravnavamo z uporabo kontrolnih kod, da bi generacijo usmerili k bolj usklajenim in ustreznim povzetkom.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཚོའི་མཉམ་དུ་སླེབས་པའི་རྣམ་པ་མེད་པའི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ལྟ་རྟོག་པའི་སྒྲིག This setting makes training simpler than previous approaches by relying only on standard log-likelihood loss and mainstream models. ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་སྐྱོང་ཐབས་ལམ་གྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་བྱ་ཚིག་ལས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Active Learning for Sequence Tagging with Deep Pre-trained Models and Bayesian Uncertainty Estimates', 'es': 'Aprendizaje activo para el etiquetado de secuencias con modelos profundos previamente entrenados y estimaciones de incertidumbre bayesiana', 'pt': 'Aprendizado ativo para marcação de sequência com modelos pré-treinados profundos e estimativas de incerteza bayesiana', 'fr': "Apprentissage actif pour le marquage de séquences avec des modèles pré-entraînés en profondeur et des estimations bayésiennes d'incertitude", 'ar': 'التعلم النشط لوضع العلامات على التسلسل باستخدام النماذج العميقة المدربة مسبقًا وتقديرات عدم اليقين البايزية', 'hi': 'गहरी पूर्व प्रशिक्षित मॉडल और बायेसियन अनिश्चितता अनुमानों के साथ अनुक्रम टैगिंग के लिए सक्रिय सीखना', 'ja': '事前に訓練された深いモデルとベイズ不確実性推定値を使用したシーケンスタグ付けのための能動的学習', 'ru': 'Активное обучение меток последовательностей с использованием глубоко подготовленных моделей и оценок неопределенности по методу Байеса', 'zh': '以深预练模贝叶斯不确定性度序者学之', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Ghníomhach do Chlibeáil Seicheamh le Múnlaí Réamhthraenáilte Deep agus Meastacháin Éiginnteachta Bayesian', 'ka': 'აკრთვიური სწავლება განსხვავებელი მაგრამებისთვის ძალიან წინასწორებული მოდელებით და ბაეზიანის უცნობიერებელი განსხვავებელი', 'el': 'Ενεργή μάθηση για τη διαδοχική σήμανση με βαθιά προ-εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα και εκτιμήσεις αβεβαιότητας', 'hu': 'Active Learning for Sequence Tagging with Deep Előképzett Modellek és Bayesian Bizonytalanság Becslések', 'it': 'Apprendimento Attivo per Sequenza Tagging con Deep Modelli Pre-addestrati e Bayesian Incertainty Stime', 'kk': 'Қалыпты алдын- ала оқылған үлгілер мен бейезия тәуелсіздік оқу үшін белсенді оқу', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran Aktif untuk Tagging Sekuensi dengan Model Terlatih Dalam-Dalam dan Estimat ketidakpastian Bayesian', 'lt': 'Aktyvus mokymasis sekos žymėjimui su giliai iš anksto parengtais modeliais ir Bayezijos neapibrėžtumo įvertinimai', 'mk': 'Активно учење за означување на секвенции со длабоки предобучени модели и проценки на бајезиска несигурност', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലുകളോടൊപ്പം സെക്കന്റ് ടാഗിങ്ങിനുള്ള സജ്ജീവമായ പഠനം', 'pl': 'Aktywne uczenie się dla znakowania sekwencji z głębokimi wstępnie trenowanymi modelami i oszacowaniem niepewności Bayesona', 'mn': 'Дараагийн тагжуулалтын актив суралцах нь гүнзгий урд сургалтын загвар болон Бейзийн тогтвортой тооцоололтой', 'mt': 'Tagħlim Attiv għat-Tagging tas-Sekwenza b’Mudelli Profondi mħarrġa minn qabel u Stimi ta’ Inċertezza Bayeżjana', 'no': 'Aktiv læring for sekvensmerking med dyppa før- trenga modeller og Bayesian Usikkerheitsestimater', 'si': 'ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණිත මොඩේල් සහ බේසියාන් අනිශ්චිත අවශ්\u200dයාවක් සඳහා ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ටැග් ගන්න ස', 'sr': 'Aktivno učenje za označavanje sekvence sa dubokim predobučenim modelima i procjenama bezsigurnosti Bayesiana', 'ro': 'Învățare activă pentru secvență Etichetare cu Modele profunde Pre-antrenate și Estimări de incertitudine Bayesian', 'sv': 'Aktivt lﾃ､rande fﾃｶr sekvens Taggning med Deep Pre-utbildade modeller och Bayesian Osﾃ､kerhetsuppskattningar', 'so': 'Active Learning for Sequence Tagging with Deep Pre-trained Models and Bayesian Unsure Estimates', 'ta': 'ஆழம் முன் பயிற்சி மாதிரிகள் மற்றும் பேயிசியன் உறுதியில்லாத கணக்கீடுகளுடன் தொடர்ந்து ஒட்டுதலுடன் செயலில் கற்று', 'ur': 'سیکوئنس ٹاگ کے لئے فعال یادگیری جو عمیق پیش آموزش کی موڈل اور Bayesian Uncertainty Estimates کے ساتھ ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tập tin để nắm bắt nhịp nhịp với các mô- đun đã được đào tạo kĩ càng và tính bất ngờ Bayesian', 'bg': 'Активно обучение за маркиране на последователност с дълбоки предварително обучени модели и Байезиански оценки за несигурност', 'da': 'Aktiv Læring for Sekvens Tagging med Deep Pre-trænede modeller og Bayesian Usikkerhedsskøn', 'hr': 'Aktivno učenje za označavanje sekvence sa dubokim predobučenim modelima i procjenama bezsigurnosti Bayesiana', 'nl': 'Actief leren voor sequentie tagging met diepe voorgetrainde modellen en Bayesiaanse onzekerheidsschattingen', 'de': 'Aktives Lernen f羹r Sequenz Tagging mit Deep Pre-Trained Modellen und Bayesschen Unsicherheitssch瓣tzungen', 'ko': '깊이 있는 예훈련 모델과 베일스의 불확실성 예측을 바탕으로 하는 서열 표기 능동 학습', 'id': 'Active Learning for Sequence Tagging with Deep Pre-trained Models and Bayesian Uncertainty Estimates', 'sw': 'Kusoma Kiongozi kwa ajili ya Uchaguzi wa Kufuatilia Mitandao ya Ki-Bayesia', 'tr': 'Gatynak öňünde eğlenen Modeller we Bayesian Gynançylyk Taýýarlamak üçin aktiw öwrenme', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Ակտիվ սովորելը խորը նախապատրաստված մոդելների և Բեյզիայի անորոշ հաշվարկների համար', 'sq': 'Mësimi aktiv për etiketat e sekuencës me modele të thella paratrajnuar dhe vlerësime të pasigurisë Bayesiane', 'af': 'Aktiewe leer vir sekwensieetiketing met diep voorafgeleerde modele en Bayesian Onsekerheid Estimates', 'az': 'D톛rzini 칐n-t톛hsil Modell톛ri v톛 Bayesian N톛qinlik Taqimlar캼 il톛 Seqsanl캼q Etilm톛si 칲칞칲n Etkinlik 칐yr톛nm톛si', 'fa': 'یادگیری فعال برای برچسب برچسب\u200cهای سطح با مدل\u200cهای پیش آموزش\u200cشده عمیق و ارزیابی بی\u200cیقین بیزیان', 'bn': 'গভীর প্রশিক্ষণ পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত মডেল এবং বেয়েশিয়ান নিশ্চিত অ্যাস্টিমেট', 'cs': 'Aktivní učení pro sekvenční tagování s hlubokými předškolenými modely a Bayesovskými odhady nejistoty', 'ca': 'Aprendiment actiu per etiquetar les seqüències amb models profunds de pré-entrenament i estimacions de la incertitud bayèsia', 'et': 'Aktiivne õpe järjestuste märgistamiseks sügavate eeltreenitud mudelitega ja bayesia ebakindluse hinnangutega', 'bs': 'Aktivno učenje za označavanje sekvence sa dubokim predobučenim modelima i procjenama bezsigurnosti Bayesiana', 'fi': 'Aktiivinen oppiminen sekvenssimallennusta varten Deep Pre-Trained Models ja Bayesian Epävarmuusarvot', 'jv': 'Aksi Ngerti kanggo Seyene Etiketan nganggep deep Pri-Tranjen model lan bayesi Uncercercerty', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Active Learning for Sequence Tagging with Deep Pre-trained Models and Bayesian Uncertainty Estimates', 'sk': 'Aktivno učenje za označevanje zaporedja z globokimi predusposobljenimi modeli in Bayezijskimi ocenami negotovosti', 'bo': 'Active Learning for Sequence Tagging with Deep Pre-trained Models and Bayesian Uncertainty Estimates'}
{'en': 'Annotating training data for sequence tagging of texts is usually very time-consuming. Recent advances in transfer learning for natural language processing in conjunction with active learning open the possibility to significantly reduce the necessary annotation budget. We are the first to thoroughly investigate this powerful combination for the sequence tagging task. We conduct an extensive empirical study of various Bayesian uncertainty estimation methods and Monte Carlo dropout options for deep pre-trained models in the active learning framework and find the best combinations for different types of models. Besides, we also demonstrate that to acquire instances during active learning, a full-size Transformer can be substituted with a distilled version, which yields better computational performance and reduces obstacles for applying deep active learning in practice.', 'ar': 'عادةً ما يكون شرح بيانات التدريب لوضع العلامات المتسلسلة للنصوص مضيعة للوقت. إن التطورات الحديثة في نقل التعلم لمعالجة اللغة الطبيعية جنبًا إلى جنب مع التعلم النشط تفتح إمكانية تقليل ميزانية التعليقات التوضيحية اللازمة بشكل كبير. نحن أول من حقق بدقة في هذه المجموعة القوية لمهمة وضع علامات التسلسل. نجري دراسة تجريبية واسعة النطاق لمختلف طرق تقدير عدم اليقين في بايز وخيارات التسرب من مونت كارلو للنماذج العميقة المدربة مسبقًا في إطار التعلم النشط والعثور على أفضل التوليفات لأنواع مختلفة من النماذج. إلى جانب ذلك ، نوضح أيضًا أنه للحصول على حالات أثناء التعلم النشط ، يمكن استبدال محول بالحجم الكامل بنسخة مقطرة ، مما ينتج عنه أداء حسابي أفضل ويقلل من العقبات التي تحول دون تطبيق التعلم النشط العميق في الممارسة.', 'fr': "L'annotation des données d'entraînement pour le marquage de séquences de textes prend généralement beaucoup de temps. Les récents progrès dans l'apprentissage par transfert pour le traitement du langage naturel en conjonction avec l'apprentissage actif ouvrent la possibilité de réduire considérablement le budget d'annotation nécessaire. Nous sommes les premiers à étudier en profondeur cette puissante combinaison pour la tâche de marquage de séquence. Nous menons une étude empirique approfondie de diverses méthodes bayésiennes d'estimation de l'incertitude et des options d'abandon de Monte Carlo pour des modèles pré-entraînés approfondis dans le cadre d'apprentissage actif et trouvons les meilleures combinaisons pour différents types de modèles. En outre, nous démontrons également que pour acquérir des instances pendant l'apprentissage actif, un Transformer complet peut être remplacé par une version distillée, ce qui permet d'obtenir de meilleures performances de calcul et de réduire les obstacles à l'application de l'apprentissage actif approfondi dans la pratique.", 'es': 'La anotación de datos de entrenamiento para el etiquetado secuencial de textos suele llevar mucho tiempo. Los avances recientes en el aprendizaje por transferencia para el procesamiento del lenguaje natural junto con el aprendizaje activo abren la posibilidad de reducir significativamente el presupuesto de anotaciones necesario. Somos los primeros en investigar a fondo esta poderosa combinación para la tarea de etiquetado de secuencias. Llevamos a cabo un extenso estudio empírico de varios métodos de estimación de la incertidumbre bayesiana y opciones de abandono de Monte Carlo para modelos profundamente entrenados previamente en el marco de aprendizaje activo y encontramos las mejores combinaciones para diferentes tipos de modelos. Además, también demostramos que para adquirir instancias durante el aprendizaje activo, se puede sustituir un Transformer de tamaño completo por una versión destilada, lo que produce un mejor rendimiento computacional y reduce los obstáculos para aplicar el aprendizaje activo profundo en la práctica.', 'pt': 'A anotação de dados de treinamento para marcação de sequência de textos geralmente consome muito tempo. Avanços recentes no aprendizado de transferência para processamento de linguagem natural em conjunto com o aprendizado ativo abrem a possibilidade de reduzir significativamente o orçamento de anotação necessário. Somos os primeiros a investigar minuciosamente essa poderosa combinação para a tarefa de marcação de sequência. Conduzimos um extenso estudo empírico de vários métodos de estimativa de incerteza Bayesiana e opções de abandono de Monte Carlo para modelos pré-treinados profundos na estrutura de aprendizado ativo e encontramos as melhores combinações para diferentes tipos de modelos. Além disso, também demonstramos que para adquirir instâncias durante o aprendizado ativo, um Transformer em tamanho real pode ser substituído por uma versão destilada, o que proporciona melhor desempenho computacional e reduz os obstáculos para a aplicação do aprendizado ativo profundo na prática.', 'ja': 'テキストのシーケンスタグ付けのためのトレーニングデータへの注釈付けは、通常、非常に時間がかかります。自然言語処理のための転送学習の最近の進歩は、能動的学習と併せて、必要な注釈予算を大幅に削減する可能性をもたらす。私たちは、シーケンスタグ付けタスクのためにこの強力な組み合わせを徹底的に調査した最初の人です。私たちは、アクティブラーニングフレームワーク内の深い事前にトレーニングされたモデルのための様々なベイズ不確実性推定方法とモンテカルロ中退オプションの広範な実証的研究を行い、さまざまなタイプのモデルのための最適な組み合わせを見つけます。さらに、アクティブラーニング中にインスタンスを取得するために、フルサイズのトランスフォーマーを蒸留バージョンで置き換えることができ、計算パフォーマンスが向上し、ディープアクティブラーニングを実際に適用するための障害を軽減することも実証しています。', 'zh': '为文本序标注训数常耗时。 自然语言移学与学合者最新进展为显损益之注可也。 我们是一个研究这种序列标记的强组的人。 吾于学框架之深贝叶斯不确定性度蒙特卡罗辍学选项博究其实,各得其宜。 又证取实于学,以蒸馏版本易尺寸Transformer,以生善算,减在实践中深度之学。', 'ru': 'Аннотирование обучающих данных для тегов последовательности текстов обычно занимает очень много времени. Недавние достижения в области трансферного обучения для обработки естественного языка в сочетании с активным обучением открывают возможность для значительного сокращения необходимого бюджета аннотаций. Мы первыми тщательно исследовали эту мощную комбинацию для задачи маркировки последовательностей. Мы проводим обширное эмпирическое исследование различных методов оценки байесовской неопределенности и вариантов отсева Монте-Карло для глубоких предварительно обученных моделей в рамках активного обучения и находим лучшие комбинации для различных типов моделей. Кроме того, мы также демонстрируем, что для получения экземпляров во время активного обучения полноразмерный Трансформатор может быть заменен дистиллированной версией, что дает лучшую вычислительную производительность и уменьшает препятствия для применения глубокого активного обучения на практике.', 'hi': 'ग्रंथों के अनुक्रम टैगिंग के लिए प्रशिक्षण डेटा एनोटेट करना आमतौर पर बहुत समय लेने वाला होता है। सक्रिय सीखने के साथ संयोजन के रूप में प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण के लिए स्थानांतरण सीखने में हाल की प्रगति आवश्यक एनोटेशन बजट को काफी कम करने की संभावना खोलती है। हम अनुक्रम टैगिंग कार्य के लिए इस शक्तिशाली संयोजन की पूरी तरह से जांच करने वाले पहले व्यक्ति हैं। हम सक्रिय सीखने के ढांचे में गहरे पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित मॉडल के लिए विभिन्न बायेसियन अनिश्चितता अनुमान विधियों और मोंटे कार्लो ड्रॉपआउट विकल्पों का एक व्यापक अनुभवजन्य अध्ययन करते हैं और विभिन्न प्रकार के मॉडलों के लिए सर्वोत्तम संयोजन पाते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम यह भी प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि सक्रिय सीखने के दौरान उदाहरण प्राप्त करने के लिए, एक पूर्ण आकार के ट्रांसफॉर्मर को एक आसुत संस्करण के साथ प्रतिस्थापित किया जा सकता है, जो बेहतर कम्प्यूटेशनल प्रदर्शन उत्पन्न करता है और अभ्यास में गहरी सक्रिय सीखने को लागू करने के लिए बाधाओं को कम करता है।', 'ga': 'Tógann sé an-am go hiondúil sonraí oiliúna a anótáil le haghaidh clibeáil seicheamhach téacsanna. De bharr dul chun cinn a rinneadh le déanaí i bhfoghlaim aistrithe do phróiseáil teanga nádúrtha i gcomhar le foghlaim ghníomhach, tá féidearthacht ann an buiséad nótaí riachtanach a laghdú go suntasach. Tá muid ar an gcéad duine a rinne imscrúdú críochnúil ar an meascán cumhachtach seo don tasc clibeála seichimh. Déanaimid staidéar eimpíreach fairsing ar mhodhanna éagsúla meastacháin neamhchinnteachta Bayesian agus roghanna fágála Monte Carlo do mhúnlaí domhain réamhoilte sa chreat foghlama gníomhaí agus aimsímid na teaglamaí is fearr le haghaidh cineálacha éagsúla samhlacha. Ina theannta sin, léirímid freisin gur féidir leagan driogtha a chur in ionad Trasfhoirmeoir lánmhéide chun cásanna a fháil le linn na foghlama gníomhaí, rud a thugann feidhmíocht ríomhaireachta níos fearr agus a laghdaíonn bacainní ar fhoghlaim dhomhain ghníomhach a chur i bhfeidhm i gcleachtas.', 'hu': 'A szövegek sorozatgyűjtéséhez szükséges képzési adatok megjegyzése általában nagyon időigényes. A természetes nyelvfeldolgozáshoz szükséges transzfertanulás terén a közelmúltbeli előrelépések az aktív tanulással együtt megnyitják a lehetőséget, hogy jelentősen csökkentsék a szükséges jegyzetelési költségvetést. Mi vagyunk az elsők, akik alaposan megvizsgálják ezt a hatékony kombinációt a sorozatcímkézési feladathoz. Széleskörű empirikus tanulmányozást végzünk különböző bayesiai bizonytalansági becslési módszerekről és Monte Carlo kilépési lehetőségekről az aktív tanulás keretében, és megtaláljuk a különböző típusú modellek legjobb kombinációit. Emellett azt is bemutatjuk, hogy a példányok aktív tanulás során történő megszerzéséhez egy teljes méretű transzformátor helyettesíthető egy desztillált verzióval, ami jobb számítási teljesítményt eredményez és csökkenti a mély aktív tanulás gyakorlati alkalmazásának akadályait.', 'el': 'Η σχολιασμός δεδομένων εκπαίδευσης για την ακολουθία ετικετών κειμένων είναι συνήθως πολύ χρονοβόρα. Πρόσφατες εξελίξεις στην εκμάθηση μεταφοράς για την επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας σε συνδυασμό με την ενεργό μάθηση ανοίγουν τη δυνατότητα να μειωθεί σημαντικά ο απαραίτητος προϋπολογισμός σχολιασμού. Είμαστε οι πρώτοι που ερευνούν διεξοδικά αυτόν τον ισχυρό συνδυασμό για την εργασία επισήμανσης ακολουθίας. Διεξάγουμε εκτενή εμπειρική μελέτη διαφόρων μεθόδων εκτίμησης αβεβαιότητας και επιλογών παράπτωσης Μόντε Κάρλο για βαθιά προ-εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα στο πλαίσιο ενεργού μάθησης και βρίσκουμε τους καλύτερους συνδυασμούς για διαφορετικούς τύπους μοντέλων. Επιπλέον, καταδεικνύουμε επίσης ότι για την απόκτηση περιπτώσεων κατά τη διάρκεια της ενεργού μάθησης, ένας μετασχηματιστής πλήρους μεγέθους μπορεί να αντικατασταθεί με μια αποσταγμένη έκδοση, η οποία αποδίδει καλύτερη υπολογιστική απόδοση και μειώνει τα εμπόδια για την εφαρμογή της βαθιάς ενεργού μάθησης στην πράξη.', 'ka': 'ტექსტის კონტაქციის მაგრამად მონაცემების მონაცემები მხოლოდ მნიშვნელოვანია. მიმდინარე წარმოდგენები ტრანსტრენსის სწავლებისთვის თავისუფალური ენის პროცესისთვის შესაძლებლობა აკრძალური სწავლებისთვის გახსნა შესაძლებლობა, რომ გა ჩვენ პირველი ვართ, რომელიც ამ ძალიან კომბინეციის შესაძლებლობისთვის გავაკეთებთ. ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ განსხვავებული ბეიზიანური უცნობიერების განსაზღვრების მეტოვების გავაკეთება და მონტე კაპლოს სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვ დამატებით, ჩვენ ასევე ევმონსტრაციებთ, რომ აკტივის სწავლების განმავლობაში ინსტრანსტრამენსტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტ', 'it': "L'annotazione dei dati di formazione per la codifica sequenziale dei testi richiede solitamente molto tempo. I recenti progressi nell'apprendimento di trasferimento per l'elaborazione della lingua naturale in combinazione con l'apprendimento attivo aprono la possibilità di ridurre significativamente il necessario budget di annotazione. Siamo i primi a investigare a fondo questa potente combinazione per il compito di tagging della sequenza. Conduciamo un ampio studio empirico di vari metodi di stima dell'incertezza bayesiana e opzioni di abbandono Monte Carlo per modelli pre-formati profondi nel quadro di apprendimento attivo e troviamo le migliori combinazioni per diversi tipi di modelli. Inoltre, dimostriamo anche che per acquisire istanze durante l'apprendimento attivo, un Transformer full-size può essere sostituito con una versione distillata, che offre migliori prestazioni computazionali e riduce gli ostacoli all'applicazione pratica del deep active learning.", 'mk': 'Онотирањето на податоците за обука за одбележување на текстови е обично многу потребно време. Неодамнешните напредоци во трансферот на учењето за природното обработување јазик заедно со активното учење ја отвораат можноста значително да се намали потребниот буџет за анотација. Ние сме првите што темелно ја истражуваме оваа моќна комбинација за задачата за означување на секвенцата. Правиме екстремна емпирична студија на различни бајезиски методи за проценка на несигурноста и опции за откажување од Монте Карло за длабоко предобучени модели во активната рамка за учење и најдеме најдобри комбинации за различни типови на модели. Покрај тоа, ние, исто така, демонстрираме дека за да се добијат инстанции за време на активното учење, целосен Трансформер може да биде заменет со дестилирана верзија, која дава подобра компјутациска перформанса и ги намалува пречките за примена на длабоко активно учење во практиката.', 'lt': 'Annotating training data for sequence tagging of texts is usually very time-consuming.  Neseniai padaryta pažanga perkeliant mokymąsi natūralioms kalboms apdoroti kartu su aktyviu mokymusi atveria galimybę gerokai sumažinti būtiną annotacijos biudžetą. Mes esame pirmieji, kurie nuodugniai ištiria šį galingą derinį sekos žymėjimo užduotims. Atliekame išsamų empirinį įvairių Bayezijos neapibrėžtumo vertinimo metodų ir Monte Carlo nutraukimo galimybių tyrimą aktyvaus mokymosi sistemoje giliai parengtiems modeliams ir ieškome geriausių įvairių tipų modelių derinių. Be to, mes taip pat įrodome, kad siekiant įgyti aktyvaus mokymosi atvejų, visiško dydžio transformatorius gali būti pakeistas distiliuota versija, kuri duoda geresnių skaičiavimo rezultatų ir mažin a kliūtis giliam aktyviam mokymuisi praktikoje.', 'ml': 'ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളുടെ സെക്കന്\u200dസ് ടാഗിങ്ങിനുള്ള പരിശീലനത്തിനുള്ള ഡേറ്റാ അറിയിക്കുന്നത് സാധാരണയായി  സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയശ്ചിത്രത്തിനായി പഠിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള അടുത്ത മുന്നോട്ടുകള്\u200d സജ്ജീവമായ പഠിക്കുന്നതിന നമ്മളാണ് ആദ്യം ഈ ശക്തിയുള്ള കൂട്ടത്തെ പരിശോധിക്കാന്\u200d ആദ്യം. ബെയിസ്യന്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ഥിതിയില്ലാത്ത ഊഹിപ്പിക്കുന്ന രീതികളെക്കുറിച്ച് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു വിശാലമായ ശ്രദ്ധ നടത്തുന്നു. മോണ്ട് കാര്\u200dലോ ആഴത്തെ പഠിപ്പിക്കപ പിന്നെ നമ്മളും കാണിക്കുന്നു, സജ്ജീവമായ പഠനത്തിനുള്ള സമയത്ത് സംഭവിക്കുന്ന സാഹചര്യങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കാന്\u200d, ഒരു മുഴുവന്\u200d വലിപ്പമുള്ള ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫ്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫെര്\u200dമ', 'mt': 'L-annotazzjoni tad-dejta tat-taħriġ għat-tikkettar tas-sekwenza tat-testi normalment tieħu ħafna ħin. L-avvanzi reċenti fit-trasferiment tat-tagħlim għall-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali flimkien mat-tagħlim attiv jiftħu l-possibbiltà li jitnaqqas b’mod sinifikanti l-baġit meħtieġ għall-annotazzjoni. Aħna l-ewwel li ninvestigaw bir-reqqa din il-kombinazzjoni qawwija għall-kompitu tat-tikkettar tas-sekwenza. We conduct an extensive empirical study of various Bayesian uncertainty estimation methods and Monte Carlo dropout options for deep pre-trained models in the active learning framework and find the best combinations for different types of models.  Barra minn hekk, nippruvaw ukoll li biex nikkwistaw każijiet matul it-tagħlim attiv, Transformer ta’ daqs sħiħ jista’ jiġi sostitwit b’verżjoni distillata, li tagħti prestazzjoni komputattiva a ħjar u tnaqqas l-ostakli għall-applikazzjoni ta’ tagħlim attiv fil-fond fil-prattika.', 'ms': 'Menganotasi data latihan untuk tag urutan teks biasanya sangat memakan masa. Recent advances in transfer learning for natural language processing in conjunction with active learning open the possibility to significantly reduce the necessary annotation budget.  Kami adalah yang pertama untuk menyelidiki secara teliti kombinasi kuat ini untuk tugas penulisan urutan. Kami melakukan kajian empirik yang luas tentang pelbagai kaedah penilaian ketidakpastian Bayesia dan pilihan Monte Carlo keluar untuk model terlatih dalam kerangka pembelajaran aktif dan mencari kombinasi terbaik untuk jenis-jenis model yang berbeza. Selain itu, kita juga menunjukkan bahawa untuk mendapatkan kes semasa pembelajaran aktif, Transformer saiz penuh boleh diganti dengan versi berwarna, yang menghasilkan prestasi komputasi yang lebih baik dan mengurangkan halangan untuk melaksanakan pembelajaran aktif dalam praktik.', 'mn': 'Сургуулийн тэмдэглэх өгөгдлийг анзаарлах нь ихэвчлэн цаг хугацаанд хэрэглэдэг. Байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн суралцах сургалтын саяхан хөгжлийн хөгжлийн талаар ажиллах суралцах нь хэрэгтэй анзаарлын төлөвлөгөө маш багасгах боломжтой болно. Бид хамгийн анхны дарааллын тэмдэглэх ажлын хүчтэй холбоотой зүйлийг судалж эхэлсэн. Бид олон Байзийн тодорхойгүй байдлын үнэлгээ, Монте Карло сургалтын гүнзгий урд сургалтын загварын сонголтуудыг судалж, олон төрлийн загваруудын хамгийн сайн нийлүүлэлтийг олж мэднэ. Үүнээс ч мөн бид актив суралцах үед тохиолдлуудыг олж авахын тулд бүрэн хэмжээтэй Трансформацуудыг хуваалцах боломжтой. Энэ нь илүү тооны үйл ажиллагааг гаргаж, дасгал дээрх актив суралцах боломжтой бэрхшээл багас', 'pl': 'Notowanie danych treningowych do sekwencyjnego tagowania tekstów jest zwykle bardzo czasochłonne. Ostatnie postępy w nauce transferowej dla przetwarzania języków naturalnych w połączeniu z aktywnym uczeniem się otwierają możliwość znacznego zmniejszenia niezbędnego budżetu adnotacyjnego. Jesteśmy pierwszymi, którzy dokładnie zbadają tę potężną kombinację do zadania tagowania sekwencji. Przeprowadzamy obszerne badania empiryczne różnych metod oszacowania niepewności Bayesowskiej oraz opcji wycofania się z Monte Carlo dla głęboko przeszkolonych modeli w ramach aktywnego uczenia się i znajdujemy najlepsze kombinacje dla różnych typów modeli. Ponadto, pokazujemy również, że aby uzyskać instancje podczas aktywnego uczenia, pełnowymiarowy Transformer można zastąpić wersją destylowaną, co daje lepszą wydajność obliczeniową i zmniejsza przeszkody w stosowaniu głębokiego aktywnego uczenia się w praktyce.', 'no': 'Merking av treningsdata for sekvensmerking av tekstar er vanlegvis veldig tidsbruka. Nyleg foregåver i læring av overføringar for naturspråkshandtering saman med aktiv læring opna muligheten for å redusera det nødvendige annotasjonsbbudsjettet. Vi er den første som forsøker denne kraftige kombinasjonen for sekvensmerking av oppgåva. We conduct an extensive empirical study of various Bayesian uncertainty estimation methods and Monte Carlo dropout options for deep pre-trained models in the active learning framework and find the best combinations for different types of models. I tillegg kan vi også demonstrare at for å henta instansar under aktive læring, kan ein fullstendig transformasjon bytte ut med ein distilert versjon, som gjer bedre datamaskina utvikling og reduserer hindringar for å bruka dype aktive læring i praksis.', 'ro': 'Adnotarea datelor de instruire pentru etichetarea secvențială a textelor este, de obicei, foarte consumatoare de timp. Progresele recente în învățarea transferurilor pentru procesarea limbilor naturale împreună cu învățarea activă deschid posibilitatea reducerii semnificative a bugetului necesar de adnotare. Suntem primii care investighează în detaliu această combinație puternică pentru sarcina de etichetare a secvențelor. Realizăm un studiu empiric amplu al diferitelor metode de estimare a incertitudinii bayesiane și opțiuni de abandon Monte Carlo pentru modele profunde pre-instruite în cadrul de învățare activă și găsim cele mai bune combinații pentru diferite tipuri de modele. În plus, demonstrăm, de asemenea, că pentru a dobândi instanțe în timpul învățării active, un Transformer full-size poate fi înlocuit cu o versiune distilată, care oferă performanțe computaționale mai bune și reduce obstacolele în calea aplicării învățării active profunde în practică.', 'sr': 'Notiranje podataka obuke za označavanje sekvence tekstova obično je vrlo potrošenje vremena. Nedavni napredak u prevozu učenja prirodnog jezika zajedno s aktivnim učenjem otvara mogućnost da značajno smanji potrebni budžet za annotaciju. Mi smo prvi koji potpuno istražujemo ovu moćnu kombinaciju za zadatak označavanja sekvence. Provodimo široko empiričko ispitivanje različitih metoda procjene bezsigurnosti Bejzija i opcije za izbacivanje Monte Carla za duboke predobučene modele u aktivnom okviru učenja i pronalazimo najbolje kombinacije za različite vrste modela. Osim toga, mi takođe pokazujemo da bi dobili instance tokom aktivnog učenja, potpuni transformer može biti zamenjen destilacijom verzije, koja daje bolju računalnu funkciju i smanjuje prepreke za primjenu dubokog aktivnog učenja na praksi.', 'so': 'Waxbarashada macluumaadka waxbarashadu waa inta badan isticmaalka xilliga. Waxbarashada afka dabiicadda ah ee la xiriira horumarinta u soo qaadashada iskuulka u soo wareejinta waxaa suurtagal ah in aad si weyn u hoosaystiro bajejetarka loo baahan yahay. Waxaynu nahay kan ugu horeeya si aad u baaritaan wadanka xoogga leh ee shaqada tagsiga dabadeed. Waxaannu sameynaa waxbarasho aad u dheer oo ku qoran qaababka qiimeynta ee Bayesian oo kala duduwan, Monte Carlo waxaynu sameynaynaa doorashooyin aad u baahan tahay tusaalaha horumarinta waxbarashada, waxaana helaynaa noocyada ugu wanaagsan ee noocyada kala duduwan. Sidoo kale waxaynu muujinnaa in marka lagu jiro waxbarashada fircoon lagu helo dhacdooyin lagu helo, waxaa lagu beddeli karaa warqad aad u kala duduwan, kaasoo soo bixinaya joojinta xisaabta ka wanaagsan, wuxuuna hoos u dhigi karaa obstacooyinka codsashada waxbarashada aad u shaqeeya.', 'si': 'පරික්ෂණයේ පරික්ෂණ පරික්ෂණ පරික්ෂණය සඳහා පරික්ෂණ දත්ත කිරීමට සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් වෙලාවක් ව ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපනය සමඟ සම්බන්ධයෙන් සම්බන්ධයෙන් ඉගෙනගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට අවශ්\u200dය විදි අපි පළමුවෙනි මේ ශක්තිමත් සම්බන්ධයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ ක්\u200dරමය ටැග් කරන්න වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන්. අපි විවිදිහට බේසියාන් අනිශ්චිත විදිහට අනිශ්චිත විදිහට සහ මොන්ට් කාර්ලෝ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරලා තියෙන හැකියාවක්  ඒ වගේම, අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා සක්\u200dරිය ඉගෙනගන්න සමහර විදියට අවස්ථාවක් ගන්න, සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වෙනස් කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය වැඩක', 'sv': 'Att notera träningsdata för sekvensmärkning av texter är vanligtvis mycket tidskrävande. De senaste framstegen inom transferinlärning för naturlig språkbehandling i kombination med aktivt lärande öppnar möjligheten att avsevärt minska den nödvändiga kommenteringsbudgeten. Vi är först med att noggrant undersöka denna kraftfulla kombination för sekvensmärkningsuppgiften. Vi genomför en omfattande empirisk studie av olika bayesianska osäkerhetsestimeringsmetoder och Monte Carlo-alternativ för djuputbildade modeller inom ramen för aktivt lärande och hittar de bästa kombinationerna för olika typer av modeller. Dessutom visar vi också att för att förvärva instanser under aktivt lärande kan en fullstorlek Transformer ersättas med en destillerad version, vilket ger bättre datorprestanda och minskar hinder för att tillämpa djupt aktivt lärande i praktiken.', 'ta': 'வரிசையான குறிப்புகளுக்கு பயிற்சி தரவை அறிவிக்கும் பொதுவாக நேரம் பயன்படுத்தல் மிகவும் நேரம். இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாட்டில் கற்றுக்கொள்ள இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாட்டிற்கான முன்னேற்றங்களை மாற்றுவதற்கு தேவைப்படும் அறி நாங்கள் முதலில் முழுமையாக ஆராய்ச்சி செய்ய இந்த சக்தியுடைய இணைப்பை தொடர்ந்து வரும் செயல்களுக்கு. நாம் பல்வேறு பேயீசியன் நம்பிக்கை முறையில்லாத மதிப்பீட்டு முறைமைகளையும் மாண்ட் கார்லோ ஆழமான முன்பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளுக்கு வெளியேற்ற வ மேலும், நாம் செயலில் கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் போது நிகழ்வுகளை பெற வேண்டும் என்பதை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம், ஒரு முழு அளவு மாற்றி ஒரு மாற்று பதிப்புடன் மாற்றப்படும், அது சி', 'kk': 'Мәтіндердің тегтерін таңдау үшін оқыту деректері әдеттегі уақыт пайдалануға болады. Назардағы оқыту үшін табиғи тілдерді өңдеу үшін оқыту үшін жаңа жұмыс істеу үшін қажетті мәліметтердің бөлшегін көбейту мүмкіндігін ашу мүмкіндігін аш Біз бірінші тапсырманы таңдау тапсырмасының күшті комбинациясын тексеру үшін. Біз әртүрлі Байезия тәуелдік оқу әдістерін және Монте Карло алдын- ала оқу бағдарламасының алдын- ала оқу бағдарламалардың үлкен эмпирикалық зерттеуді және әртүрлі моделдердің ең жақсы комбинацияларын та Қосымша, біз белсенді үйрену кезінде инстанцияларды алу үшін толық өлшемі түрлендіруші дегенді көрсетуге болады. Бұл компьютердің жақсы жұмыс істейтін және практикадағы терең белсенді оқыту үшін бұлдарды азайтады.', 'ur': 'ٹیکسٹ ٹاگ کے لئے ترینسی ڈیٹوں کو انٹیٹ کرنا معمولاً بہت وقت مصرف کرتا ہے. فعال تعلیم کے ساتھ فعال کی تعلیم کے ساتھ طبیعی زبان پرسس کے لئے ترنسیٹر کی تعلیم کے لئے اخیر اضافہ ہونے کی امکان کھول رہی ہے کہ ضروری اضافہ کے بوجٹ کو مزید کم کرنے کے لئے۔ ہم سب سے پہلے اس طاقتور ترکیب کے لئے مطابق تحقیق کرنے والے ہیں۔ ہم مختلف بئیسی کی غیرمضبوطی مطالعہ کے مطالعہ اور مونٹ کارلو کو ڈروپوٹ اختیار کے لئے عمیق پیش آموزش کی موڈل کے لئے عمدہ مطالعہ کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں اور مختلف موڈل کے لئے بہترین ترکیب پیدا کرتے ہیں. اور ہم بھی دکھاتے ہیں کہ فعال تعلیم کے موقع مواقع حاصل کرنے کے لئے ایک پورا سایز ترنسفور کو ایک متفرق نسخہ سے بدل سکتا ہے، جو بہتر کامپیوتر کی فعالیت حاصل کرتا ہے اور عمیق فعال تعلیم کے لئے دھوکا دیتا ہے۔', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Keyingi taʼminlovchi taʼminlovchi tilni o'rganish uchun o'rganish uchun o'qituvchi taʼminlovchi darajalari Biz birinchi birinchi birinchi ko'pchilik tashkilotlari uchun juda katta birinchi birinchi qidirish. Biz Bayezcha haqiqatgina qiymatlik usullarining juda katta muvaffaqiyatli o'qituvchimiz va Monte Carlo'ni aktiv o'rganish qatorida o'rganish modellarini o'zgartiradi va turli modellarning eng yaxshi bir bir xil birikmasini topamiz. Ko'pchilik, biz aktiv o'rganishda xususiyatlarni olishni ko'rsatdik, butun oʻlchami o'zgarishga oʻzgartirish mumkin. Bu juda yaxshi kompyuterni bajarishi va juda aktiv o'rganishni qo'llash mumkin.", 'vi': 'Thông tin ghi chú về việc đánh dấu chuỗi các văn bản thường tốn rất nhiều thời gian. Những tiến bộ gần đây trong việc học cách truyền đơn cho việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên kết hợp với việc học hành mở rộng khả năng giảm đáng kể ngân sách ghi chú cần thiết. Chúng tôi là những người đầu tiên nghiên cứu kỹ sự kết hợp mạnh mẽ này cho việc hiệu chỉnh chuỗi. Chúng tôi thực hiện một nghiên cứu đầy đủ về các phương pháp đánh giá rủi ro người Bayezian khác nhau và Monte Carlo từ bỏ các phương pháp nghiên cứu sâu những mô hình được rèn luyện sẵn trong cơ sở học hành động và tìm ra những kết hợp tốt nhất cho các loại mô- đun khác nhau. Bên cạnh đó, chúng tôi cũng chứng minh rằng để có trường hợp học hoạt động, một Transformer có thể thay thế một phiên bản chưng cất, đem lại hiệu suất tính tốt hơn và làm giảm các cản trở cho việc thực hiện việc học tập hoạt động sâu.', 'nl': 'Het aantekenen van trainingsgegevens voor sequentie tagging van teksten is meestal erg tijdrovend. Recente vooruitgang in transferleren voor natuurlijke taalverwerking in combinatie met actief leren biedt de mogelijkheid om het benodigde annotatiebudget aanzienlijk te verminderen. We zijn de eerste die deze krachtige combinatie grondig onderzoeken voor de sequence tagging taak. We voeren een uitgebreide empirische studie uit van verschillende Bayesiaanse onzekerheidsschattingsmethoden en Monte Carlo dropout opties voor diepe voorgetrainde modellen in het actieve leerkader en vinden de beste combinaties voor verschillende soorten modellen. Daarnaast tonen we ook aan dat om instances te verwerven tijdens actief leren, een full-size Transformer kan worden vervangen door een gedistilleerde versie, wat betere rekenprestaties levert en obstakels voor het toepassen van deep active learning in de praktijk vermindert.', 'bg': 'Анотирането на данни за обучение за последователно маркиране на текстове обикновено отнема много време. Неотдавнашният напредък в трансферното обучение за обработка на естествения език във връзка с активното обучение отваря възможност за значително намаляване на необходимия бюджет за анотация. Ние сме първите, които подробно изследват тази мощна комбинация за задачата за маркиране на последователността. Провеждаме обширно емпирично проучване на различни Байсийски методи за оценка на неопределеността и опции за отпадане от Монте Карло за дълбоко предварително обучени модели в рамката за активно обучение и намираме най-добрите комбинации за различни видове модели. Освен това демонстрираме, че за придобиване на инстанции по време на активно обучение трансформатор в пълен размер може да бъде заменен с дестилирана версия, която дава по-добра компютърна производителност и намалява пречките за прилагане на активно обучение в практиката.', 'da': 'Anmærkning af træningsdata til sekvensmærkning af tekster er normalt meget tidskrævende. De seneste fremskridt inden for overførselsindlæring til naturlig sprogbehandling i forbindelse med aktiv læring åbner mulighed for betydeligt at reducere det nødvendige annoteringsbudget. Vi er de første til grundigt at undersøge denne kraftfulde kombination til sekvens tagging opgaven. Vi gennemfører en omfattende empirisk undersøgelse af forskellige Bayesian usikkerhedsestimeringsmetoder og Monte Carlo dropout muligheder for dybe prætrænede modeller i den aktive læringsramme og finder de bedste kombinationer for forskellige typer modeller. Desuden viser vi også, at for at erhverve instanser under aktiv læring, kan en fuld størrelse Transformer erstattes med en destilleret version, hvilket giver bedre beregningsydelse og reducerer hindringer for at anvende dyb aktiv læring i praksis.', 'hr': 'Notiranje podataka obuke za označavanje sekvence tekstova obično je vrlo potrošeno vrijeme. Nedavni napredak prijevoza prirodnog jezika zajedno s aktivnim učenjem otvara mogućnost značajno smanjiti potrebni proračun za annotacije. Mi smo prvi koji temeljno istražujemo ovu moćnu kombinaciju za zadatak označavanja sekvence. Provodimo široko empiričko ispitivanje različitih metoda procjene bezsigurnosti Bayesija i mogućnosti potopljenja Monte Carla za duboko predobučene modele u aktivnom okviru učenja i pronalazimo najbolje kombinacije za različite vrste modela. Osim toga, također pokazujemo da bi se prikupili slučajevi tijekom aktivnog učenja, potpuni Transformer može zamijeniti destiliranom verzijom, koja daje bolju računalnu funkciju i smanjuje prepreke za primjenu dubokog aktivnog učenja na praksi.', 'de': 'Das Annotieren von Trainingsdaten zur Sequenz-Tagging von Texten ist in der Regel sehr zeitaufwendig. Neuere Fortschritte beim Transferlernen für die Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache in Verbindung mit aktivem Lernen eröffnen die Möglichkeit, das notwendige Annotationsbudget deutlich zu reduzieren. Wir sind die ersten, die diese leistungsstarke Kombination für die Sequenz-Tagging-Aufgabe gründlich untersuchen. Wir führen eine umfangreiche empirische Untersuchung verschiedener Bayesischer Unsicherheitsschätzungsmethoden und Monte Carlo Abbruch Optionen für tief trainierte Modelle im aktiven Lernframework durch und finden die besten Kombinationen für verschiedene Arten von Modellen. Außerdem zeigen wir, dass zum Erwerb von Instanzen während des aktiven Lernens ein Transformer in voller Größe durch eine destillierte Version ersetzt werden kann, was eine bessere Rechenleistung liefert und Hindernisse für die Anwendung von Deep Active Learning in der Praxis reduziert.', 'id': 'Menganotasi data pelatihan untuk penandaian urutan teks biasanya sangat memakan waktu. Kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam transfer belajar untuk proses bahasa alam bersama dengan belajar aktif membuka kemungkinan untuk mengurangi anggaran anotasi yang diperlukan. Kami yang pertama menyelidiki dengan teliti kombinasi yang kuat ini untuk tugas penulisan urutan. Kami melakukan penelitian empiris ekstensif dari berbagai metode penilaian ketidakpastian Bayesia dan pilihan keluar Monte Carlo untuk model yang terlatih dalam rangka pembelajaran aktif dan menemukan kombinasi terbaik untuk jenis model yang berbeda. Selain itu, kami juga menunjukkan bahwa untuk memperoleh kejadian selama belajar aktif, Transformer ukuran penuh dapat diganti dengan versi distil, yang memberikan prestasi komputasi yang lebih baik dan mengurangi halangan untuk menerapkan belajar aktif dalam praktik.', 'ko': '텍스트 시퀀스에 주석을 표시하기 위한 훈련 데이터는 보통 시간이 많이 걸립니다.자연 언어 처리 이동 학습과 능동 학습이 결합된 최신 진전은 필요한 주석 예산을 대폭 줄이는 데 가능성을 제공했다.우리는 처음으로 서열 표기 임무 중의 이런 강력한 조합을 철저히 연구한 사람이다.우리는 주동적인 학습 구조에서 각종 베일스의 불확실성 평가 방법과 깊이 있는 예훈련 모델의 몬테카로 퇴출 옵션에 대해 광범위한 실증 연구를 하고 서로 다른 유형 모델의 가장 좋은 조합을 찾았다.또한 능동 학습 과정에서 실례를 얻기 위해 하나의 증류판으로 전체 사이즈의 변환기를 교체하면 더욱 좋은 계산 성능을 얻을 수 있고 실천에서 깊이 있는 능동 학습을 응용하는 장애를 줄일 수 있음을 증명했다.', 'fa': 'اعلام داده\u200cهای آموزش برای نقاشی ترکیب متن معمولاً بسیار زمان استفاده می\u200cکند. پیشرفت های اخیر در انتقال یادگیری برای پردازش زبان طبیعی با یادگیری فعال شانسی را باز می\u200cکند که به طور معنی بودجه نوشتن نیاز را کاهش دهد. ما اولین کسانی هستیم که به طور کامل این ترکیب قدرتمندی را برای وظیفه ترکیب بررسی کردند. ما یک مطالعه عمومی وسیع از روش ارزیابی بی\u200cیقینی مختلف بیس\u200cها و گزینه\u200cهای غیرقابل تعلیم مانت کارلو را برای مدل\u200cهای پیش آموزش عمیق در چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها علاوه بر این، ما همچنین نشان می دهیم که برای گرفتن مواقع یادگیری فعال، یک تغییردهنده کامل اندازه کامل می تواند با یک نسخه جدا شده جایگزین شود، که اجرای محاسبات بهتر را می دهد و بازداشت های عمیقی برای کاربرد یادگیری فعال در تمرین را کاهش می دهد.', 'sw': 'Kutangaza taarifa za mafunzo kwa ajili ya viungo vya mfululizo wa maandishi mara nyingi ni matumizi ya muda. Maendeleo ya hivi karibuni katika kuhamisha kujifunza kwa ajili ya upasuaji wa lugha asilia pamoja na kujifunza kwa haraka kufungua uwezekano wa kupunguza bajeti inayohitajika ya kutangaza. Sisi ni wa kwanza kuchunguza kwa kina muungano huu wenye nguvu kwa ajili ya kazi ya viungo vya mfululizo. Tunafanya utafiti wa msisitizo mkubwa wa namna mbalimbali za estimation za Bayesia usio na uhakika na Monte Carlo hutoa chaguo za mifano yenye mafunzo ya ndani katika mfumo wa kujifunza na kutafuta muunganiko bora zaidi kwa aina mbalimbali. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaonyesha pia kuwa kupata matukio wakati wa kujifunza haraka, Transfer mkubwa unaweza kubadilishwa kwa toleo lililo tofauti, ambalo linaleta utendaji bora wa hisabati na kupunguza vikwazo kwa kutumia elimu ya kina za ndani katika mazoea.', 'tr': 'Metin taglamalary üçin eğitim maglumaty duýdurmak adatça wagt tüketmelidir. Doýal dil işlemegi üçin öwrenmek üçin ýakyn öwrenmek üçin ullanýan öňki täzeliklerde gerekli täzelikler bütçesini azaltmak üçin mümkin edip biler. Biz bu güýçli birleşigi sequence tagging işi üçin ilkinji gezek çykarmak üçin. Biz beýleki beýeziýanyň kesinliksiz taryşma yöntemlerini we Monte Carlo-yň derin öňünden öňünden öňünden öňünden öňünden öňünden öňünden gelen nusgalary üçin örän uly empirik studiýany çykýarys we farklı nusgalar üçin iň gowy kombinatsiyalary tapýarys. Munuň ýagdaýynda, aktiw öwrenmek wagtynda örnekler almak üçin, dolu uly bir transformatör diňleşen bir wersiýa bilen üýtgebilir we bu sistemasy gowy kompýuter eserlerini täsir edýär we praktikada gaty aktiw öwrenmek üçin engelleri azatlar.', 'af': "Opleidingsdata vir sekwensiemerking van tekste is gewoonlik baie tyd- gebruik. Onlangse vorderings in oordrag van onderwerp vir natuurlike taal verwerking saam met aktiewe leer oop die moontlik om die nodige annotasie budžet te verminder. Ons is die eerste om hierdie kragtige kombinasie te ondersoek vir die volgorde merking taak. Ons doen 'n uitbreidige empiriese studie van verskeie Bayesianse onversekerheid-estimasie metodes en Monte Carlo-dropout opsies vir diep pre-opgelei modele in die aktiewe leer raamwerk en vind die beste kombinasies vir verskeie tipes van modele. Ons bevestig ook dat om voorbeelde te kry tydens aktiewe leer, 'n volgrootte Transformeerder kan vervang word met 'n verskillende weergawe, wat beter rekenaasjonale prestasie gee en verduur hinders vir die toepassing van diep aktiewe leer in praksie.", 'am': 'የጽሑፎች ማቀናጃ ማቀናጃ ማሳየት የጽሑፍ ማቀናቀል ብዙ ጊዜ-consumer ነው፡፡ የተፈለገውን የቋንቋ ስርዓት ለመማር ለመቀናቀል የሚደረጉትን ቅድሚያ በተጨማሪው ትምህርት በመግለጥ የሚቻለውን ማስታወቂያውን በአስቸጋሪው ግንኙነት በማሳነስ ይችላል፡፡ ይህ ኃይለኛን አካባቢ ግንኙነት ለመፍጠር መጀመሪያ ነው፡፡ የባይስውያንን ባለማረጋገጫ ጥናት እና ሞንቴር ካርሎ በተማሩት ትምህርት ሥርዓት ውስጥ ለጥልቅ ምርጫዎች እና ለልዩ ዓይነት ዓይነቶች የሚሻለውን ጥሩ ማስተማርን እናግኛለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ በተማሩ ጊዜ የምናስታውቀው ጥያቄዎችን ለማግኘት፣ ሙሉ ትርጉም በተለየ መልስ ይለውጣል፣ ይህም የተሻለ የቁጥጥር ስርዓት ማድረግ እና ጥልቅ ተማሪ ለመጠቀም የሚችሉትን ግንቦች ያጎድላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Տեղադրելը հաղորդագրությունների հաջորդականության նշումների մասին ուսումնասիրության տվյալներ սովորաբար շատ ժամանակ է պահանջում: Վերջին առաջընթացները սովորելու փոխանցման համար բնական լեզվի վերաբերյալ միասին ակտիվ սովորելու համար բացում են հնարավորությունը նշանակալի նվազեցնել անհրաժեշտ նոտացիայի բյուջեն: Մենք առաջիններն ենք, ովքեր հիմնականում ուսումնասիրեցին այս հզոր համադրությունը հաջորդականության նշանակման խնդրի համար: Մենք կատարում ենք տարբեր Բեյզիայի անորոշության գնահատման մեթոդների էքսպանցիկ էմպիրիկ ուսումնասիրություն և Մոնտե Կարլոյի ընտրությունները լքելու համար հիմնական նախապատրաստված մոդելների համար ակտիվ ուսումնասիրության շրջանակում և գտնում ենք տարբեր տեսակի մո Ավելին, մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ակտիվ ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում օրինակներ ձեռք բերելու համար ամբողջ չափի տրանսֆորմատոր կարող է փոխարինվել բաժանված տարբերակով, որը ավելի լավ հաշվարկների արդյունք է տալիս և նվազեցնում է խորը ակտիվ ուսումնասիրության գործնական ընթա', 'az': 'Mətnlərin sıralama etiketləri üçün təhsil verilən məlumatları çox vaxt istifadə edir. Təbiətli dil işləməsi üçün qeyri-təbiətli öyrənmək üçün son öyrənmələrin fəaliyyətli öyrənmə mümkün olmasını çox azaltmaq üçün açıq. Biz bu qüvvətli kombinatsiyayı seçmə işi üçün ilk dəfə araşdıran biriyik. Biz müxtəlif Bayezi təhlükəsizlik hesablama metodlarını və Monte Carlo təhlükəsizlik əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş modellər üçün çox empirik təhsil edirik və fərqli modellər üçün ən yaxşı kombinasyon tapırıq. Əksinə, biz də göstəririk ki, aktif öyrənmə sırasında örnəklər almaq üçün, tamamilə ölçülü Transformer dəyişdirilmiş bir versiyon ilə əvəz oluna bilər, ki daha yaxşı hesaplama performansını verər və praksiyada a ğır aktif öyrənmə üçün çətinlikləri azaldır.', 'bn': 'টেক্সট ট্যাগিং এর জন্য প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য সাধারণত সময়-ব্যবহার করা খুব বেশি। প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার ক্ষেত্রে সাম্প্রতিক অগ্রগতির সাথে সক্রিয় শিক্ষার সাথে সাথে প্রকৃত ভাষার প্রক্রিয়ার শিক্ আমরা প্রথমে এই শক্তিশালী মিনিটের কাজের জন্য গভীর তদন্ত করি। আমরা বেয়েসিয়ার বিভিন্ন নিশ্চিত হিসেবে গভীর প্রশিক্ষিত মডেলের জন্য একটি বিস্তারিত কার্যক্রম গবেষণা করি এবং বিভিন্ন ধরনের মডেলের জন্য সেরা সংযোগ খুঁজে পা এছাড়াও আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে সক্রিয় শিক্ষার সময় অনুষ্ঠান গ্রহণ করতে পারি, একটি পুরো আকারের ট্রান্সফার্মার এক বিচ্ছিন্ন সংস্করণের সাথে পরিবর্তন করতে পারে, যার ফলে গণনাত্র', 'bs': 'Notiranje podataka obuke za označavanje sekvence tekstova obično je vrlo potrošeno vrijeme. Nedavni napredak u prevozu učenja prirodnog jezika zajedno s aktivnim učenjem otvara mogućnost da značajno smanji potrebni budžet za annotaciju. Mi smo prvi koji temeljno istražujemo ovu moćnu kombinaciju za zadatak označavanja sekvence. Provodimo široko empiričko ispitivanje različitih metoda procjene bezsigurnosti Bayesija i mogućnosti potopljenja Monte Carla za duboke predobučene modele u aktivnom okviru učenja i pronalazimo najbolje kombinacije za različite vrste modela. Osim toga, također pokazujemo da bi se prikupili slučajevi tijekom aktivnog učenja, potpuni Transformer može zamijeniti destiliranom verzijom, koja daje bolju računalnu funkciju i smanjuje prepreke za primjenu dubokog aktivnog učenja na praksi.', 'ca': "Anotar dades d'entrenament per etiquetar seqüències de textos costa molt de temps. Els avanços recents en la transfer ència d'aprenentatge per al processament natural de llenguatges juntament amb l'aprenentatge actiu obren la possibilitat de reduir significativament el pressupost d'anotació necessari. Som els primers a investigar completament aquesta combinació poderosa per a la tasca d'etiquetage de seqüències. Fem un estudi empíric extens de diversos mètodes bayèsius d'estimació de l'incertitud i opcions d'abandon de Monte Carlo per a models profundament pré-entrenats en el marc d'aprenentatge actiu i trobem les millors combinacions per a diferents tipus de models. A més, també demostrem que per adquirir instances durant l'aprenentatge actiu, un Transformer de gran mida pot ser substituït per una versió destilada, que produeix millor rendiment computacional i redueix els obstacles per aplicar aprenentatge actiu profund a la pràctica.", 'sq': 'Shkruajtja e të dhënave të stërvitjes për shënimin e sekuencës së teksteve zakonisht është shumë e nevojshme për kohë. Përparimet e fundit në transferimin e mësimit për procesimin natyror të gjuhës së bashku me mësimin aktiv hapin mundësinë për të reduktuar ndjeshëm buxhetin e nevojshëm të anotacionit. Ne jemi të parët që hetojmë në mënyrë të thellë këtë kombinim të fuqishëm për detyrën e shënimit të sekuencës. Ne kryejmë një studim të gjerë empirik të metodave të ndryshme të vlerësimit të pasigurisë Bayesiane dhe opsioneve të braktisjes së Monte Carlos për modele të thella të paratrajnuara në kuadrin aktiv të mësimit dhe të gjejmë kombinimet më të mira për lloje të ndryshme modelesh. Përveç kësaj, ne gjithashtu demonstrojmë se për të fituar raste gjatë mësimit aktiv, një Transformues i madhësisë së plotë mund të zëvendësohet me një version të distiluar, i cili jep performancë më të mirë llogaritare dhe redukton pengesat për aplikimin e mësimit të thellë aktiv në praktikë.', 'et': 'Koolitusandmete annoteerimine tekstide järjestuse sildistamiseks on tavaliselt väga aeganõudev. Hiljutised edusammud siirdeõppes looduskeele töötlemiseks koos aktiivse õppega avavad võimaluse märkimisväärselt vähendada vajalikku märkuste eelarvet. Oleme esimesed, kes põhjalikult uurivad seda võimsat kombinatsiooni järjestuse märgistamise ülesandeks. Teostame laiaulatusliku empiirilise uuringu erinevatest Bayesi ebamõõtemääramatuse hindamise meetoditest ja Monte Carlo väljalangemise võimalustest sügavate eelõpetatud mudelite jaoks aktiivse õppe raamistikus ning leiame parimad kombinatsioonid erinevate mudelite jaoks. Lisaks demonstreerime, et aktiivse õppe käigus eksemplaride omandamiseks saab täissuuruses transformaatori asendada destilleeritud versiooniga, mis annab parema arvutusjõudluse ja vähendab takistusi aktiivse sügavõppe rakendamisel praktikas.', 'fi': 'Harjoitustietojen merkitseminen tekstien sekvenssimerkkausta varten on yleensä hyvin aikaa vievää. Luonnonkielen käsittelyn siirtooppimisen viimeaikainen edistyminen yhdessä aktiivisen oppimisen kanssa avaa mahdollisuuden vähentää merkittävästi tarvittavaa merkintäbudjettia. Olemme ensimmäisiä, jotka tutkivat perusteellisesti tätä tehokasta yhdistelmää sekvenssimerkkaustehtävää varten. Teemme laajan empiirisen tutkimuksen bayesilaisista epävarmuuden estimointimenetelmistä ja Monte Carlo -pudotusvaihtoehdoista syvälle esikoulutetuille malleille aktiivisessa oppimiskehyksessä ja etsimme parhaat yhdistelmät erityyppisille malleille. Lisäksi osoitamme, että aktiivisen oppimisen aikana tapahtuvien instanssien hankkimiseksi täysikokoinen muuntaja voidaan korvata tislatulla versiolla, joka tuottaa paremman laskennallisen suorituskyvyn ja vähentää esteitä syvän aktiivisen oppimisen soveltamiselle käytännössä.', 'cs': 'Anotace tréninkových dat pro sekvenční tagování textů je obvykle velmi časově náročné. Nedávné pokroky v transferovém učení pro zpracování přirozeného jazyka ve spojení s aktivním učením otevírají možnost výrazně snížit potřebný rozpočet anotací. Jsme první, kdo důkladně prozkoumá tuto silnou kombinaci pro úlohu sekvenčního tagování. Provádíme rozsáhlou empirickou studii různých Bayesovských metod odhadu nejistoty a možností výpočtu Monte Carlo pro hluboké předškolené modely v rámci aktivního učení a najdeme nejlepší kombinace pro různé typy modelů. Kromě toho také demonstrujeme, že pro získání instancí během aktivního učení lze plnohodnotný transformátor nahradit destilovanou verzí, což přináší lepší výpočetní výkon a snižuje překážky pro aplikaci hlubokého aktivního učení v praxi.', 'sk': 'Anotiranje podatkov o usposabljanju za označevanje zaporedja besedil je običajno zelo dolgotrajno. Nedavni napredek pri prenosnem učenju za obdelavo naravnega jezika v povezavi z aktivnim učenjem omogoča znatno zmanjšanje potrebnega proračuna za opombe. Smo prvi, ki temeljito raziskujemo to zmogljivo kombinacijo za nalogo označevanja zaporedja. Izvedli smo obsežno empirično študijo različnih bajzijskih metod ocenjevanja negotovosti in možnosti opustitve Monte Carlo za globoke predusposobljene modele v okviru aktivnega učenja ter poiskali najboljše kombinacije za različne vrste modelov. Poleg tega dokazujemo tudi, da je za pridobivanje primerov med aktivnim učenjem mogoče transformator polne velikosti nadomestiti z destilirano različico, ki zagotavlja boljšo računalniško zmogljivost in zmanjšuje ovire za uporabo globinskega aktivnega učenja v praksi.', 'jv': 'Learn Mode FindOK Awak dhéwé sing perusahaan nganggo cara-cara sing nguasakno iki dadi sing nguasakno Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem empiresi sing nggawe lanjut sistem sing paling awak dhéwé bayesyan karo DroPout nggawe sistem sing dibutuhke sistem sing gawe nguasai sistem sing gawe lanjut cara-teka lan nggawe sistem sing paling dhéwé. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing gawe nguasai perkaraan akeh model sing kalaay Nanging, awak dhéwé mulasakno ngono kuwi nggawe akeh operasi ning tuturang liyane, transformer sing gawe ngubah versi sing komputer sing bisa dilawak dhéwé, kuwi mau ngerasakno operasi komputer sing luwih apik lan ujarang kuwi nggawe aturan kalacara nggawe', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis @ info: whatsthis Mu ne farkon da za mu yi bincike bayan wannan komai mai ƙarfi ga aikin tagogin na dabam. Ana sami aikin littafan tamko na bayesian wasu hanyoyin takwai da ba'a sani ba, kuma muna karɓi zaɓallin ayuka na saurara wa masu motsi masu da aka yi wa kwanza a cikin firam da za'a yi amfani da shi, kuma munã sami komai da mafi kyaun kwamfyutan misãlai daban. Da wannan, Muke nuna da cewa za'a sami masu motsi a lokacin da aka karanta shi, za'a musanya wani tsohon-cikakken Transformer a sami-tsohon, wanda ke ƙara mafiya lissafar lissafi kuma yana ƙara hanyõyi da za'a yi amfani da amfani da masu sakan aiki na fara ɗaya.", 'he': 'Annotating training data for sequence tagging of texts is usually very time-consuming.  Recent advances in transfer learning for natural language processing in conjunction with active learning open the possibility to significantly reduce the necessary annotation budget.  We are the first to thoroughly investigate this powerful combination for the sequence tagging task.  We conduct an extensive empirical study of various Bayesian uncertainty estimation methods and Monte Carlo dropout options for deep pre-trained models in the active learning framework and find the best combinations for different types of models.  Besides, we also demonstrate that to acquire instances during active learning, a full-size Transformer can be substituted with a distilled version, which yields better computational performance and reduces obstacles for applying deep active learning in practice.', 'bo': 'ཡིག་གེའི་དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་ལ་སྔར་སྐབས་དུས་འཕགས་མེད་པའི་ལྟ་སྟངས རང་བཟོས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལས་སྦྱོར་བའི་སྐུལ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་འཕེལ་རིམ། ང་ཚོ་ནི་དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་དང་པོ་ནས་དབུས་མཐུན་འདི་ལྟ་རྟོག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། We conduct an extensive empirical study of various Bayesian uncertainty estimation methods and Monte Carlo dropout options for deep pre-trained models in the active learning framework and find the best combinations for different types of models. Besides, we also demonstrate that to acquire instances during active learning, a full-size Transformer can be substituted with a distilled version, which yields better computational performance and reduces obstacles for applying deep active learning in practice.'}
{'en': 'BERT Prescriptions to Avoid Unwanted Headaches : A Comparison of Transformer Architectures for Adverse Drug Event Detection', 'ar': 'وصفات BERT لتجنب الصداع غير المرغوب فيه: مقارنة بين بنى المحولات للكشف عن أحداث المخدرات الضارة', 'pt': 'Prescrições BERT para evitar dores de cabeça indesejadas: uma comparação de arquiteturas de transformadores para detecção de eventos adversos de medicamentos', 'fr': 'Prescriptions BERT pour éviter les maux de tête indésirables\xa0: comparaison des architectures de transformateurs pour la détection des effets indésirables des médicaments', 'es': 'Prescripciones de BERT para evitar dolores de cabeza no deseados: una comparación de arquitecturas de transformadores para la detección de eventos adversos de fármacos', 'ja': '不要な頭痛を避けるためのBERT処方：有害薬物事象検出のための変圧器アーキテクチャの比較', 'zh': '避意外头痛BERT处方:用药不良事检变压器结构较之', 'ru': 'BERT Prescriptions to Avoid Unwanted Headache: A Comparison of Transformer Architectures for Negative Drug Event Detection (Предписания BERT по предотвращению нежелательных головных болей: сравнение архитектур трансформаторов для обнаружения нежелательных лекарственных явлений)', 'hi': 'अवांछित सिरदर्द से बचने के लिए BERT नुस्खे: प्रतिकूल दवा घटना का पता लगाने के लिए ट्रांसफॉर्मर आर्किटेक्चर की तुलना', 'ga': 'Oidis BERT chun Tinneas Cinn Gan Teas a Sheachaint: Comparáid idir Ailtirí Trasfhoirmeoirí le hAghaidh Teagmhais Dhíobhálacha Drugaí a Bhrath', 'hu': 'BERT receptek a nem kívánt fejfájás elkerülésére: a transzformátor architektúráinak összehasonlítása a kívánatos gyógyszerek eseményeinek észlelésére', 'el': 'Συνταγές για την αποφυγή ανεπιθύμητων πονοκεφάλων: Μια σύγκριση αρχιτεκτονικών μετασχηματιστών για την ανίχνευση ανεπιθύμητων συμβάντων φαρμάκων', 'ka': 'BERT პრესკრიპციები არ მინდა დაკავშირება: ტრანფორმეტრის აქტიქტურების შემდგომარება შემდგომარებისთვის შემდგომარება', 'it': 'Prescrizioni BERT per evitare mal di testa indesiderate: un confronto tra le architetture dei trasformatori per la rilevazione di eventi avversi da farmaci', 'kk': 'БЕРТ қаламаған айдардың ауырмаларын шешу үшін белгілер: Қарастырғы наркотикалық оқиғаларды анықтау үшін түрлендіруші архитектураларының салыстыру', 'lt': 'BERT receptas, skirtas išvengti nepageidaujamo galvos skausmo: nepageidaujamų reiškinių aptikimui skirtų transformatorių architektūros palyginimas', 'mk': 'Берт Преписи за избегнување непријатни главоболки: споредба на трансформарните архитектури за детективирање на негативни случаи на дрога', 'ms': 'Preskripsi BERT untuk menghindari sakit kepala tidak diinginkan: A Comparison of Transformer Architectures for Adverse Drug Event Detection', 'ml': 'BERT Prescriptions to Avoid Unwanted Headaches: A Comparison of Transformer Architectures for Adverse Drug Event Detection', 'mt': 'BERT Preskrizzjonijiet biex jiġu evitati uġigħ ta’ ras mhux mixtieq: Tqabbil ta’ Arkitetturi Transformaturi għal Sejbien ta’ Avvenimenti Avversi tal-Mediċina', 'mn': 'БЕРТ Хэрэггүй толгой өвчнөөс алдагдахын тулд дарааллын дарааллын дарааллын дарааллын харьцуулалт', 'no': 'BERT- skrifter for å unngå uventa hovudsøk: A Comparison of Transformer Architectures for Adverse Drug Event Detection', 'pl': 'Recepty BERT w celu uniknięcia niechcianych bólów głowy: Porównanie architektur transformatorów do wykrywania zdarzeń niepożądanych leków', 'ro': 'Prescripţii BERT pentru evitarea durerilor de cap nedorite: o comparaţie a arhitecturilor transformatoare pentru detectarea evenimentelor adverse ale medicamentelor', 'sr': 'Pripisi za izbjegavanje neželjenih glavobolja: usporedba transformatorskih arhitektura za otkrivanje događaja protiv narkotika', 'si': 'BERT ප්\u200dරිස්ක්\u200dරිප්ටියෝ අවශ්\u200dයය නැති ඔළුවන් වේදනය නැති කරගන්න: A Comparison of Transfer Designers for advise Drug Eve Detection', 'sv': 'BERT-recept för att undvika oönskad huvudvärk: En jämförelse av transformatorarkitekturer för detektering av biverkningar', 'so': 'BERT ka sii daabacaan madaxyada Unwanted: A Comparison of Transformer Architectures for Adverse Drug Detection', 'ur': 'BERT Prescriptions to avoid unwanted Headaches: A Comparison of Transformer Architectures for Adverse Drug Event Detection', 'ta': 'விரும்பாத தலைப்புகளை தவிர்', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Người kê đơn của BERT để tránh đau đầu không muốn: Sự So sánh của kiến trúc biến hình cho sự phát hiện phản ứng về ma túy.', 'nl': 'BERT-voorschriften om ongewenste hoofdpijn te voorkomen: een vergelijking van transformatorarchitecturen voor detectie van bijwerkingen van geneesmiddelen', 'hr': 'BERT Pripisi za izbjegavanje neočekivanih glavobolja: usporedba transformacijskih arhitektura za otkrivanje nuspojavnih događaja droge', 'bg': 'Рецепти за избягване на нежелано главоболие: сравнение на архитектурите на трансформаторите за откриване на нежелани лекарствени събития', 'da': 'BERT-recepter til at undgå uønskede hovedpine: En sammenligning af transformatorarkitekturer til detektion af bivirkninger af lægemidler', 'id': 'BERT Preskripsi untuk menghindari sakit kepala tidak diinginkan: A Comparison of Transformer Architectures for Adverse Drug Event Detection', 'fa': 'نوشته\u200cهای BERT برای جلوگیری از سردرد ناخواسته: یک مقایسه معماری تغییر\u200cدهنده برای شناسایی حادثه مواد مخالف', 'sw': 'Mapendekezo ya BERT Kujiepusha vichwa vya habari zisizotajwa: Makasiliano ya Wasafiri kwa ajili ya Utafiti wa Matukio ya Usafiri', 'de': 'BERT-Rezepturen zur Vermeidung unerwünschter Kopfschmerzen: Ein Vergleich von Transformatorarchitekturen zur Erkennung unerwünschter Arzneimittelereignisse', 'ko': '불필요한 두통을 피하는 BERT 처방: 약물 불량 사건 검측에 사용되는 변압기 구조의 비교', 'tr': 'BERT islemeýän kelläp agyrlamakdan çykarmak üçin remizler: Nädogry ýagdaýyň üstüne görkezilişi', 'af': "BERT Preskripte na Verwyder Onverwende Koppyke: ' n Vergelyking van Transformer Architecture vir Adverse Drug Event Deteksie", 'sq': 'BERT Preskrimet për të shmangur dhimbje koke të padëshiruara: Një krahasim i arkitekturave të transformuara për zbulimin e ngjarjeve të drogës së keqe', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'ԲԵՌԹ Անցանկանալի գլխացավ խուսափելու նշաններ. Անցանկանալի դեպքերի հայտնաբերման վերափոխման ճարտարապետության համեմատություն', 'az': 'BERT Başlıq ağrısından qaçırmaq üçün təsirlər: A Comparison of Transformer Architectures for Adverse Drug Event Detection', 'bn': 'BERT Prescriptions to Avoid Unwanted Headaches: A Comparison of Transformer Architectures for Adverse Drug Event Detection', 'bs': 'BERT Pripisi za izbjegavanje neočekivanih glavobolja: usporedba transformacijskih arhitektura za otkrivanje događaja protiv narkotika', 'ca': "Prescripcions BERT per evitar mals de cap no desitjats: Una comparació d'arquitectures transformadores per detectar eventos adversos de medicaments", 'cs': 'Předpisy BERT k předcházení nežádoucím bolestem hlavy: Porovnání architektur transformátorů pro detekci nežádoucích léčiv', 'et': 'BERT retseptid soovimatute peavalude vältimiseks: Transformerite arhitektuuride võrdlus kõrvaltoimete tuvastamiseks', 'fi': 'BERT Reseptit ei-toivottujen päänsärkyjen välttämiseksi: Muuntajien arkkitehtuurien vertailu haittavaikutusten havaitsemisessa', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'BERT Raskrit kanggo Peringkat Panjenengan Gak Cocok Nari: Kompatisi ng Transformer architectures kanggo Peringkat Drog events detection', 'he': 'תיקונים BERT כדי להימנע מכאבי ראש לא רצויים: שיוון של ארכיטקטורות טרנספורסטריות לגילוי אירועי סמים לא רצויים', 'sk': 'BERT recepti za preprečevanje neželenih glavobolov: primerjava arhitektur transformatorjev za odkrivanje neželenih učinkov zdravil', 'bo': 'BERT Prescriptions to Avoid Unwanted Headaches: A Comparison of Transformer Architectures for Adverse Drug Event Detection'}
{'en': 'Pretrained transformer-based models, such as BERT and its variants, have become a common choice to obtain state-of-the-art performances in NLP tasks. In the identification of Adverse Drug Events (ADE) from social media texts, for example, BERT architectures rank first in the leaderboard. However, a systematic comparison between these models has not yet been done. In this paper, we aim at shedding light on the differences between their performance analyzing the results of 12 models, tested on two standard benchmarks. SpanBERT and PubMedBERT emerged as the best models in our evaluation : this result clearly shows that span-based pretraining gives a decisive advantage in the precise recognition of ADEs, and that in-domain language pretraining is particularly useful when the transformer model is trained just on biomedical text from scratch.', 'ar': 'أصبحت النماذج القائمة على المحولات ، مثل BERT ومتغيراتها ، خيارًا شائعًا للحصول على أحدث العروض في مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. في تحديد أحداث الأدوية الضارة (ADE) من نصوص وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي ، على سبيل المثال ، تحتل أبنية BERT المرتبة الأولى في لوحة المتصدرين. ومع ذلك ، لم يتم إجراء مقارنة منهجية بين هذه النماذج حتى الآن. في هذا البحث ، نهدف إلى تسليط الضوء على الفروق بين أدائهم بتحليل نتائج 12 نموذجًا ، تم اختبارها على معيارين معياريين. برز SpanBERT و PubMedBERT كأفضل النماذج في تقييمنا: تُظهر هذه النتيجة بوضوح أن التدريب المسبق القائم على الامتداد يعطي ميزة حاسمة في التعرف الدقيق على ADEs ، وأن التدريب المسبق للغة داخل المجال مفيد بشكل خاص عندما يتم تدريب نموذج المحول على نص طبي حيوي من الصفر.', 'es': 'Los modelos preentrenados basados en transformadores, como BERT y sus variantes, se han convertido en una opción común para obtener resultados de vanguardia en las tareas de PNL. En la identificación de eventos adversos a medicamentos (ADE) de los textos de las redes sociales, por ejemplo, las arquitecturas BERT ocupan el primer lugar en la clasificación. Sin embargo, aún no se ha hecho una comparación sistemática entre estos modelos. En este artículo, nuestro objetivo es arrojar luz sobre las diferencias entre su rendimiento analizando los resultados de 12 modelos, probados en dos puntos de referencia estándar. Spanbert y PubMedbert emergieron como los mejores modelos en nuestra evaluación: este resultado demuestra claramente que el preentrenamiento basado en el span ofrece una ventaja decisiva en el reconocimiento preciso de los ADE, y que el preentrenamiento del lenguaje en el dominio es particularmente útil cuando el modelo transformer se entrena solo en texto biomédico desde cero.', 'fr': "Les modèles préentraînés basés sur des transformateurs, tels que BERT et ses variantes, sont devenus un choix courant pour obtenir des performances de pointe dans les tâches de PNL. Dans l'identification des événements médicamenteux indésirables (ADE) à partir de textes de médias sociaux, par exemple, les architectures BERT occupent la première place dans le classement. Cependant, aucune comparaison systématique entre ces modèles n'a encore été effectuée. Dans cet article, nous visons à mettre en lumière les différences entre leurs performances en analysant les résultats de 12 modèles, testés sur deux benchmarks standard. SpanBert et PubMedbert sont apparus comme les meilleurs modèles dans notre évaluation\xa0: ce résultat montre clairement que le pré-apprentissage basé sur span donne un avantage décisif dans la reconnaissance précise des ADE, et que la préformation linguistique dans le domaine est particulièrement utile lorsque le modèle de transformateur est formé uniquement sur du texte biomédical à partir de zéro.", 'pt': 'Modelos baseados em transformadores pré-treinados, como BERT e suas variantes, tornaram-se uma escolha comum para obter desempenhos de última geração em tarefas de PNL. Na identificação de Eventos Adversos a Medicamentos (ADE) a partir de textos de mídia social, por exemplo, as arquiteturas BERT ocupam o primeiro lugar na tabela de classificação. No entanto, ainda não foi feita uma comparação sistemática entre esses modelos. Neste artigo, buscamos esclarecer as diferenças entre seus desempenhos analisando os resultados de 12 modelos, testados em dois benchmarks padrão. SpanBERT e PubMedBERT surgiram como os melhores modelos em nossa avaliação: este resultado mostra claramente que o pré-treinamento baseado em span oferece uma vantagem decisiva no reconhecimento preciso de ADEs, e que o pré-treinamento de linguagem no domínio é particularmente útil quando o modelo de transformador é treinado apenas em texto biomédico do zero.', 'ja': 'BERTやそのバリアントなどの事前訓練された変圧器ベースのモデルは、NLPタスクで最先端のパフォーマンスを得るための一般的な選択肢となっています。例えば、ソーシャルメディアテキストからの有害薬物事象（ ADE ）の同定では、BERTアーキテクチャはリーダーボードで1位です。しかしながら、これらのモデル間の系統的な比較はまだ行われていない。本稿では、2つの標準ベンチマークで試験された12モデルの結果を分析することで、それらの性能の違いを明らかにすることを目的とする。SpanBERTとPubMedBERTは、私たちの評価における最良のモデルとして登場しました。この結果は、スパンベースの事前トレーニングがADEの正確な認識に決定的な利点をもたらすことを明確に示しており、トランスフォーマーモデルがバイオメディカルテキストだけで一からトレーニングされる場合、ドメイン内の言語事前トレーニングが特に有用であることを示しています。', 'zh': '盖预练之基于变压器,若BERT及其变体,已为NLP之先进。 如从社交媒体文中识不良药物事(ADE)时,BERT架构在排行榜中第一。 然未有以较之也。 本文之中,指明其两准之12,形性之异也。 SpanBERT与PubMedBERT评估为上式:明于跨度预练于精识ADE有决定性之势,而转换器始于生物医学文本,域内语言预练特有用。', 'hi': 'प्रीट्रेन्ड ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित मॉडल, जैसे कि BERT और इसके वेरिएंट, एनएलपी कार्यों में अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करने के लिए एक सामान्य विकल्प बन गए हैं। सोशल मीडिया ग्रंथों से प्रतिकूल दवा घटनाओं (एडीई) की पहचान में, उदाहरण के लिए, BERT आर्किटेक्चर लीडरबोर्ड में पहले स्थान पर हैं। हालांकि, इन मॉडलों के बीच एक व्यवस्थित तुलना अभी तक नहीं की गई है। इस पेपर में, हम 12 मॉडलों के परिणामों का विश्लेषण करने वाले उनके प्रदर्शन के बीच अंतर पर प्रकाश डालने का लक्ष्य रखते हैं, जो दो मानक बेंचमार्क पर परीक्षण किए गए हैं। SpanBERT और PubMedBERT हमारे मूल्यांकन में सबसे अच्छे मॉडल के रूप में उभरे: यह परिणाम स्पष्ट रूप से दिखाता है कि स्पैन-आधारित प्रीट्रेनिंग एडीई की सटीक मान्यता में एक निर्णायक लाभ देता है, और यह कि इन-डोमेन भाषा प्रीट्रेनिंग विशेष रूप से उपयोगी है जब ट्रांसफॉर्मर मॉडल को खरोंच से बायोमेडिकल टेक्स्ट पर प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है।', 'ru': 'Предварительно обученные модели на основе трансформаторов, такие как BERT и его варианты, стали распространенным выбором для получения самых современных характеристик в задачах NLP. Например, при выявлении нежелательных явлений, связанных с лекарственными препаратами (ADE), из текстов в социальных сетях архитектуры BERT занимают первое место в списке лидеров. Однако систематического сопоставления между этими моделями пока не проводилось. В этой статье мы стремимся пролить свет на различия между их производительностью, анализируя результаты 12 моделей, протестированных на двух стандартных эталонах. SpanBERT и PubMedBERT стали лучшими моделями в нашей оценке: этот результат ясно показывает, что предварительное обучение на основе диапазона дает решающее преимущество в точном распознавании ADES, и что предварительное обучение языку в домене особенно полезно, когда модель трансформатора обучается только на биомедицинском тексте с нуля.', 'ga': 'Tá múnlaí réamhoilte bunaithe ar chlaochladán, mar BERT agus a leaganacha, ina rogha choitianta anois chun léirithe den scoth a fháil i dtascanna NLP. I sainaithint Teagmhais Dhíobhálacha Drugaí (ADE) ó théacsanna na meán sóisialta, mar shampla, tá ailtireachtaí BERT ar an gcéad dul síos ar an gclár ceannairí. Mar sin féin, níl comparáid chórasach idir na samhlacha seo déanta go fóill. Sa pháipéar seo, tá sé mar aidhm againn solas a chur ar na difríochtaí idir a bhfeidhmíocht agus anailís á déanamh ar thorthaí 12 mhúnla, arna dtástáil ar dhá thagarmharc caighdeánach. Tháinig SpanBERT agus PubMedBERT chun cinn mar na múnlaí is fearr inár meastóireacht: léiríonn an toradh seo go soiléir go dtugann réamhoiliúint réise buntáiste cinntitheach maidir le haitheantas beacht ADEanna, agus go bhfuil réamhoiliúint teanga in-fhearainn an-úsáideach nuair a bhíonn an tsamhail claochladáin oilte díreach ar aghaidh. Téacs bithleighis ón tús.', 'el': 'Τα προσχεδιασμένα μοντέλα μετασχηματιστών, όπως το BERT και οι παραλλαγές του, έχουν γίνει μια κοινή επιλογή για την επίτευξη επιδόσεων τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε εργασίες NLP. Για παράδειγμα, στην αναγνώριση ανεπιθύμητων συμβάντων φαρμάκων (ADE) από κείμενα κοινωνικών μέσων, οι αρχιτεκτονικές του βρίσκονται στην πρώτη θέση στην κατάταξη. Ωστόσο, δεν έχει γίνει ακόμη συστηματική σύγκριση μεταξύ αυτών των μοντέλων. Στην παρούσα εργασία, στοχεύουμε να ρίξουμε φως στις διαφορές μεταξύ της απόδοσής τους αναλύοντας τα αποτελέσματα των δώδεκα μοντέλων, που ελέγχονται σε δύο τυποποιημένα κριτήρια αναφοράς. Το SpanBERT και το PubMedBERT αναδύθηκαν ως τα καλύτερα μοντέλα στην αξιολόγησή μας: αυτό το αποτέλεσμα δείχνει σαφώς ότι η προ-εκπαίδευση με βάση το εύρος παρέχει ένα αποφασιστικό πλεονέκτημα στην ακριβή αναγνώριση των ADE, και ότι η προ-εκπαίδευση γλώσσας εντός του τομέα είναι ιδιαίτερα χρήσιμη όταν το μοντέλο μετασχηματιστή εκπαιδεύεται μόνο σε βιοϊατρικό κείμενο από την αρχή.', 'hu': 'Az előkészített transzformátorokon alapuló modellek, mint például a BERT és annak változatai, közös választássá váltak a legkorszerűbb teljesítmények elérésére az NLP feladatokban. A nemkívánatos gyógyszerek eseményeinek (ADE) a közösségi média szövegeiből történő azonosítása során például a BERT architektúrák az első helyen állnak a ranglistában. Ezen modellek közötti szisztematikus összehasonlítás azonban még nem történt. Jelen tanulmányban arra törekszünk, hogy megvilágítsuk a teljesítményük közötti különbségeket, elemzve 12 modell eredményeit, amelyeket két standard referenciaértéken teszteltek. Értékelésünk során a SpanBERT és PubMedBERT a legjobb modellek közé került: ez az eredmény egyértelműen azt mutatja, hogy a span alapú előkészítés döntő előnyt jelent az ADE-k pontos felismerésében, és hogy a domain belüli nyelvi előkészítés különösen hasznos, ha a transzformátor modellt kizárólag orvosbiológiai szövegre képezik.', 'ka': 'მოდელები, როგორც BERT და მისი გარიანტები, გახდა საერთო არჩევა, რომ NLP მოქმედებში მსოფლიო მონაცემები მიიღოთ. სოციალური მედია ტექსტიდან, მაგალითად, BERT არქტიქტურების პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველზე. მაგრამ ამ მოდელის შორის სისტემატიკური შემდგომარება არ მოხდა. ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ მივიღებთ გადაწყვეტის განსხვავებას 12 მოდელის შედეგების ანალიზაციას, ორი სტანდარტური ბენქმარის შედეგების შეცვლა. SpanBERT და PubMedBERT გახდა როგორც ჩვენი განსაზღვრებულებაში უკეთესი მოდელები: ეს შედეგი გაჩვენებს, რომ განსაზღვრებულია განსაზღვრებულია განსაზღვრებულია ADEs-ის წარმოდგენისთვის, და რომ საშუალო ენის წარმოდგენისთვის განსაზღვრებულია განსაზღვრებული', 'it': "I modelli pretrattati basati su trasformatori, come BERT e le sue varianti, sono diventati una scelta comune per ottenere prestazioni all'avanguardia nelle attività NLP. Nell'identificazione degli eventi avversi alla droga (ADE) dai testi dei social media, ad esempio, le architetture BERT si posizionano al primo posto nella classifica. Tuttavia, non è stato ancora effettuato un confronto sistematico tra questi modelli. In questo articolo, puntiamo a fare luce sulle differenze tra le loro prestazioni analizzando i risultati di 12 modelli, testati su due benchmark standard. SpanBERT e PubMedBERT sono emersi come i migliori modelli nella nostra valutazione: questo risultato dimostra chiaramente che il pretraining basato su span offre un vantaggio decisivo nel riconoscimento preciso delle ADE e che il pretraining in-domain language è particolarmente utile quando il modello del trasformatore viene addestrato solo su testo biomedico da zero.", 'lt': 'Iš anksto parengti transformatoriais pagrįsti modeliai, pavyzdžiui, BERT ir jo variantai, tapo bendru pasirinkimu pasiekti naujausius rezultatus NLP užduotyse. Nustatant nepageidaujamus narkotikų reiškinius (ADE) iš social in ės žiniasklaidos tekstų, pavyzdžiui, BERT architektūros pirmą kartą priskiriamos prie vadovų. Tačiau sistemingas šių modelių palyginimas dar nebuvo atliktas. Šiame dokumente siekiame išaiškinti skirtumus tarp jų veiklos rezultatų analizuojant 12 modelių rezultatus, išbandytus pagal du standartinius lyginamuosius rodiklius. SpanBERT ir PubMedBERT pasirodė kaip geriausi mūsų vertinimo modeliai: šis rezultatas aiškiai rodo, kad išankstinis mokymas, pagrįstas išankstiniu mokymu, suteikia lemiamą pranašumą tiksliai pripažįstant ADE, ir kad išankstinis mokymas kalbų srityje yra ypač naudingas, kai transformatoriaus modelis mokomas tik biomediciniu tekstu iš pradžių.', 'mk': 'Претренираните модели базирани на трансформатори, како што се БЕРТ и нејзините варијанти, станаа заеднички избор за добивање најсовремени изведби во задачите на НЛП. Во идентификацијата на Негативните Настани на дрога (АДЕ) од текстовите на социјалните медиуми, на пример, архитектурите на БЕРТ се рангираат први во водечката табла. Сепак, систематска споредба помеѓу овие модели сé уште не е направена. Во овој документ, ние имаме за цел да ги разликуваме разликите помеѓу нивните резултати анализирајќи ги резултатите на 12 модели, тестирани на два стандардни benchmarks. SpanBERT и PubMedBERT се појавија како најдобри модели во нашата оценка: овој резултат јасно покажува дека претренирањето базирано на span дава одлучна предност во прецизното признавање на ADE, и дека претренирањето на јазикот во доменот е особено корисно кога моделот на трансформаторот е трениран само на биомедицински текст од нула.', 'kk': 'BERT және оның варианттары сияқты түрлендіруші үлгілері NLP тапсырмалардың күй- жайымдық жұмыс істеу үшін жалпы таңдау болды. Мысалы, BERT архитектуралары басқару бордында бірінші ретінде қарсы наркотикалық оқиғаларды (ADE) анықтау үшін. Бірақ бұл үлгілер арасындағы жүйелік салыстыру әлі істемеген. Бұл қағазда 12 моделінің нәтижелерін анализ, екі стандартты бағдарламаларда тексерілген жарықтың айырмашылығын өзгерту мақсатымыз. SpanBERT және PubMedBERT бағалаудың ең жақсы үлгілері ретінде көрсетілді: бұл сәтті сәттеу негізінде тәртіпке тәртіпке тәртіпке тәртіпке жеткізетін ADE- лердің дұрыс түсініктеріне артықшылық артықшылығын көрсетеді, және домендегі тілдерінің', 'ms': 'Model berasaskan pengubah yang telah dilatih dahulu, seperti BERT dan variasinya, telah menjadi pilihan umum untuk mendapatkan prestasi state-of-the-art dalam tugas NLP. Dalam pengenalpasti peristiwa dadah (ADE) dari teks media sosial, contohnya, arkitektur BERT berturut pertama dalam papan utama. Namun, perbandingan sistemik antara model ini belum dilakukan. Dalam kertas ini, kami bertujuan untuk melemparkan cahaya pada perbezaan antara prestasi mereka menganalisis hasil 12 model, diuji pada dua tanda referensi piawai. SpanBERT dan PubMedBERT muncul sebagai model terbaik dalam penilaian kami: hasil ini jelas menunjukkan bahawa pralatihan berdasarkan jangka memberikan keuntungan yang menentukan dalam pengenalan tepat ADE, dan bahawa pralatihan bahasa dalam domain sangat berguna apabila model pengubah dilatih hanya pada teks biomedis dari awal.', 'mt': 'Mudelli bbażati fuq trasformaturi mħarrġa minn qabel, bħall-BERT u l-varjanti tiegħu, saru għa żla komuni biex jinkisbu prestazzjonijiet l-aktar avvanzati fil-kompiti NLP. Fl-identifikazzjoni ta’ Avvenimenti Avversi tad-Droga (ADE) minn testi tal-midja soċjali, pereżempju, l-arkitetturi tal-BERT jikklassifikaw l-ewwel fit-tabella ewlenija. Madankollu, għadu ma sar tqabbil sistematiku bejn dawn il-mudelli. F’dan id-dokument, għandna l-għan li nibgħu dawl fuq id-differenzi bejn il-prestazzjoni tagħhom li janalizzaw ir-riżultati ta’ 12-il mudell, ittestjati fuq żewġ punti ta’ riferiment standard. SpanBERT and PubMedBERT emerged as the best models in our evaluation: this result clearly shows that span-based pretraining gives a decisive advantage in the precise recognition of ADEs, and that in-domain language pretraining is particularly useful when the transformer model is trained just on biomedical text from scratch.', 'pl': 'Wstępne modele oparte na transformatorach, takie jak BERT i jego warianty, stały się powszechnym wyborem, aby uzyskać najnowocześniejsze wydajności w zadaniach NLP. Na przykład w identyfikacji zdarzeń niepożądanych z tekstów mediów społecznościowych architektury BERT zajmują pierwsze miejsce w rankingu. Nie dokonano jeszcze jednak systematycznego porównania tych modeli. W niniejszym artykule chcemy rzucić światło na różnice między ich wydajnością analizując wyniki 12-tych modeli, przetestowanych na dwóch standardowych wskaźnikach referencyjnych. SpanBERT i PubMedBERT okazały się najlepszymi modelami w naszej ocenie: wynik ten wyraźnie pokazuje, że wstępny trening oparty na rozpoznawaniu ADE daje decydującą przewagę w precyzyjnym rozpoznawaniu ADE, a wstępny trening językowy w domenie jest szczególnie przydatny, gdy model transformatora jest trenowany tylko na tekście biomedycznym od podstaw.', 'mn': 'БЕРТ болон түүний өөрчлөлтийн загварууд нь NLP ажиллагаанд урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг гаргах нийтлэг сонголт болсон. Нийгмийн мэдээллийн текстүүдийн эсрэг эм үйл явдал (ADE) тодорхойлолтын тулд, жишээлбэл, BERT архитектурууд эхлээд удирдагч буудалд байдаг. Гэвч эдгээр загваруудын систематикийн харьцуулалт хэзээ ч хийгдсэн. Энэ цаасан дээр бид 12 загварын үр дүнг шалгаж, хоёр стандарт багц дээр шалгаж байгаа өөрчлөлт дээр гэрлийг шинэчлэхэд зориулсан. SpanBERT болон PubMedBERT бидний дүгнэлтийн хамгийн сайн загвар болсон. Энэ үр дүн нь тодорхой харагдаж байгаа юм. ДОХ-ын тодорхойлолт нь ДОХ-ын тодорхойлолтын үнэ цэнэтэй боломжтой боломжтой боломжтой болсон юм. Түүний үр дүнд өөрчлөгч загвар нь зөвхөн биологийн меди', 'no': 'Om transformeringsbaserte modeller, som BERT og variasjonane, har blitt ein vanleg val for å få tilstanden av kunsten i NLP- oppgåver. I identifiseringa av Adverse Drug Events (ADE) frå sosiale media-tekstar, for eksempel, BERT-arkitekturar rankerer først i lederbordet. Det er imidlertid ikkje noko systematisk samanlikning mellom desse modelane. I denne papiret mål vi å skilja lys på ulike forskjeller mellom utviklinga deres som analyserer resultatet av 12 modeller, testert på to standardvanker. SpanBERT og PubMedBERT oppstod som dei beste modelane i evalueringa vårt: dette resultatet viser tydelig at spenbaserte trekking gjer eit avgjørende fordel i nøyaktig gjenkjenning av ADEs, og at område i domenet er spesielt nyttig når transformeringsmodellen vert trent bare på biomedisk tekst frå rådet.', 'ro': 'Modelele prepregătite bazate pe transformatoare, cum ar fi BERT și variantele sale, au devenit o alegere comună pentru a obține performanțe de ultimă generație în sarcinile PNL. În identificarea evenimentelor adverse de droguri (ADE) din textele rețelelor de socializare, de exemplu, arhitecturile BERT se situează pe primul loc în clasament. Cu toate acestea, nu s-a efectuat încă o comparație sistematică între aceste modele. În această lucrare, ne propunem să facem lumină asupra diferențelor dintre performanțele acestora analizând rezultatele a 12 modele testate pe două criterii standard. SpanBERT și PubMedBERT au apărut ca cele mai bune modele în evaluarea noastră: acest rezultat arată clar că pregătirea bazată pe interval oferă un avantaj decisiv în recunoașterea precisă a ADE și că pregătirea limbajului în domeniu este deosebit de utilă atunci când modelul transformatorului este instruit doar pe text biomedical de la zero.', 'sr': 'Preklinjeni modeli na transformaciji, kao što su BERT i njegovi varianti, postali su zajednički izbor da dobiju state-of-the-art performances u NLP zadatkima. U identifikaciji nesporaznih događaja droge (ADE) iz tekstova socijalnih medija, na primjer, arhitekture BERT prvo čine u vodećoj ploči. Međutim, sistematska usporedba između ovih modela još nije urađena. U ovom papiru imamo cilj da otkrijemo svjetlo razlike između njihovih rezultata analiziranja rezultata 12 modela, testovanih na dva standardna kritika. SpanBERT i PubMedBERT su se pojavili kao najbolji modeli u našoj procjeni: to je jasno pokazalo da se prepreka na osnovu razdoblja predstavlja odluènu prednost u preciznom priznanju ADE-a, i da je prepreka jezika u domenu posebno korisna kada je model transformacije obučen samo na biomedicinskom tekstu iz ogrebotine.', 'si': 'BERT සහ එයාගේ වෙනස් වර්ගයක් වගේම ප්\u200dරමාණ කරුණාකරණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණ කරුණාකරණය සඳහා නිර්මාණය කරුණාකරණය සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය ව සාමාජික මධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයම පාළුවන් වලින් ප්\u200dරවේශනය (ADE) ගැන හොයාගන්න, උදාහරණයෙන්, BERT විද්\u200dයාපෘතිය පළමුවෙන් ප්\u200d ඒත්, මේ මොඩල් අතර පද්ධතිය සම්බන්ධයක් තියෙන්නේ නෑ. මේ පත්තරේ අපි අල්ලගන්නවා ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණ බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දෙකට පරීක්ෂා කරනවා ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණතාව විශ්ලේෂණයේ ප්\u200dර spanBERT සහ PubMedBERT අපේ විශ්ලේෂණයේ හොඳ මොඩේල් වලින් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන්: මේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා කියලා ස්පන්ධ වි', 'so': "Tusaale horumarinta isbedelka, tusaale ahaan BERT iyo isbedelayaashiisa, waxay u noqdeen doorasho caadi ah oo ay ka helaan shaqooyinka NLP-da-farshaxanka. Aqoonsashada dhacdooyinka dhakhaatiirta (ADE) ee warqadaha sooshaalka, tusaale ahaan dhismaha BERT waxay marka ugu horeysa hogaamiyaha. Si kastaba ha ahaatee tusaalahan u dhexeeyo is-barbardhig nidaamka ah weli lama samayn. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku qoraynaa iftiinka ku saabsan kala duwanaanshaha sameynta sameynta noocyada 12, oo lagu tijaabiyey labada sawir oo standard ah. SpanBERT iyo PubMedBERT waxay u soo baxeen sida qaababka ugu wanaagsan ee qiimeynteena: taas darteed bayaan ayaa u muuqanaya in qofka span-based ah uu faa'iido gaar ah ku siiyo aqoonsiga ADEs, iyo in afka gudaha ah laguu soo daajiyo si gaar ah u faa’iido marka qaabka beddelka looga barayo qoraalka dhaqaale ee dhakhtarka ah.", 'sv': 'Förtränade transformatorbaserade modeller, som BERT och dess varianter, har blivit ett vanligt val för att uppnå toppmoderna prestanda i NLP-uppgifter. När det gäller identifiering av Adverse Drug Events (ADE) från sociala medier, till exempel, rankas BERT-arkitekturerna först i topplistan. En systematisk jämförelse mellan dessa modeller har dock ännu inte gjorts. I denna uppsats syftar vi till att belysa skillnaderna mellan deras prestanda genom att analysera resultaten av 12 modeller, testade på två standardriktmärken. SpanBERT och PubMedBERT framträdde som de bästa modellerna i vår utvärdering: detta resultat visar tydligt att span-baserad förbehandling ger en avgörande fördel vid exakt igenkänning av ADE, och att förbehandling inom domänspråk är särskilt användbart när transformatormodellen tränas bara på biomedicinsk text från grunden.', 'ml': 'ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയും അതിന്റെ മാറ്റങ്ങളും പോലെ പരിശീലനിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലുകള്\u200d NLP ജോലികളില്\u200d നിന്നും ആര്\u200dട്ട് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി സാമൂഹ്യ മെഡിയാ ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വിവരങ്ങളുടെ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതില്\u200d ബെര്\u200dട്ടി ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടുകള്\u200d ആദ എന്നാലും, ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d ഒരു സിസ്റ്റമിക്ക് തുല്യമായ തുല്യമാണ് ഇതുവരെ ചെയ്തിട്ടില്ല. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, അവയുടെ പ്രകടനത്തിന്\u200dറെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d വെളിച്ചമാക്കുവാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ലക്ഷ്യമ SpanBERT and PubMedBERT emerged as the best models in our evaluation: this result clearly shows that span-based pretraining gives a decisive advantage in the precise recognition of ADEs, and that in-domain language pretraining is particularly useful when the transformer model is trained just on biomedical text from scratch.', 'ur': 'ڈرانسٹر بنیادی موڈل، جیسے BERT اور اس کے متغیرات، NLP کے کاموں میں ایٹیٹ-ایٹ-ایٹ-ایٹ پیدا کرنے کے لئے ایک عام انتخاب ہوگئے ہیں۔ سوسیل میڈیا ٹیکسٹ (ADE) سے مخالف ڈراگ ایڈینٹوں کی شناسایی میں، مثال، BERT معماری پہلے لیڈربورڈ میں درجے ہیں۔ لیکن ان نمڈلوں کے درمیان ایک سیستمی مقایسہ هنوز نہیں کیا گیا ہے۔ ہم اس کاغذ میں چمکتے ہیں کہ ان کی عملکرد کے درمیان تفاوتوں پر چمکتے ہیں جو 12 نمڈلوں کے نتائج تحلیل کرتے ہیں، دو استاندارڈ بنچم مارک پر آزمائش کی جاتی ہیں. SpanBERT اور PubMedBERT ہمارے ارزیابی میں سب سے بہترین نمونڈل کے طور پر ظاہر ہوئے: یہ نتیجہ واضح دکھاتا ہے کہ اسپین بنیاد پرینٹ نے ADEs کی دقیق شناسایی میں ایک فیصلہ فائدہ دیتا ہے، اور ڈومین کی زبان پرینٹ ویسے ہی فائدہ دیتا ہے جب تبدیل کرنے والے نمونڈل صرف اسکرٹ سے بیوڈیسی متن پر آم', 'ta': 'BERT மற்றும் அதன் மாறிகள் போன்ற முன்னேற்றப்பட்ட மாற்றங்கள் NLP பணிகளில் உள்ள கலைஞர் செயல்பாடுகளை பெறுவதற்கு ஒரு பொதுவான தேர்வாகி ஆகி உதாரணமாக, BERT அமைப்புகள் தலைப்புபலகையில் முதலில் உள்ள முதலில் உள்ள முதலில் உள்ள முதலில் உள்ள முதலில் உள்ளது. ஆனால், இந்த மாதிரிகளுக்கிடையில் முறைமையான ஒப்பீடு இன்னும் செய்யப்படவில்லை. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் வெளிச்சத்தை வெளிச்சமாக்க வேண்டும் என்று நோக்குகிறோம் 12 மாதிரிகளின் முடிவுகளை ஆய்வு செய்யும்  ஸ்பான்பெர்ட் மற்றும் புப்மெட்பிரெட் எங்கள் மதிப்பில் சிறந்த மாதிரிகளாக வெளிப்படையாக வருகிறது: இது தெளிவாக காட்டுகிறது ஸ்பான் அடிப்படையில் இருந்து மாற்றும் மாதிரி மாதிரியில் சிறப்', 'uz': "Comment Masalan, shaxsiy medyaya matnlaridan boshqa narsalar (ADE) hodisalarni aniqlash uchun BERT muammolari boshqaruvchidagi birinchi darajada. Lekin, bu modellar orasidagi tizim o'xshash hosil qilmagan. In this paper, we aim at shedding light on the differences between their performance analyzing the results of 12 models, tested on two standard benchmarks.  Name", 'vi': 'Những mẫu biến hình được ngụy trang, như BERT và các biến thể của nó, đã trở thành lựa chọn phổ biến để đạt được những trình diễn tuyệt vời trong các nhiệm vụ NLP. Nhận dạng những sự kiện ma túy trái phép (ADE) từ các văn bản truyền thông xã hội, ví dụ, kiến trúc của BERT đứng đầu trên bảng xếp hạng. Tuy nhiên, vẫn chưa có một cuộc so sánh mô hình này. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi hướng tới việc soi sáng sự khác nhau giữa khả năng của họ phân tích kết quả của 12, được thử trên hai tiêu chuẩn tiêu điểm. Trong cuộc đánh giá của chúng ta, SpanBERT và PubMedBERT đã phát triển thành những mẫu tốt nhất thế này. Kết quả này cho thấy rõ ràng rằng chất lượng trước mắt đã tạo ra một lợi thế quyết định khi nhận dạng ADEs chính xác, và rằng lượng chuẩn bị ngôn ngữ nội bộ đặc biệt hữu dụng khi mô hình người biến đổi được rèn luyện chỉ dựa trên văn bản sinh học từ đầu.', 'bg': 'Претренираните трансформаторни модели, като BERT и неговите варианти, се превърнаха в общ избор за получаване на най-съвременни изпълнения в задачите на НЛО. При идентифицирането на нежелани лекарствени събития (АДЕ) от текстове в социалните медии например архитектурите на BERT заемат първо място в класацията. Все още не е направено систематично сравнение между тези модели. В настоящата статия имаме за цел да хвърлим светлина върху разликите между тяхната производителност, анализирайки резултатите от 12 модела, тествани на две стандартни показатели. В нашата оценка се оказаха най-добрите модели: този резултат ясно показва, че предтренирането на базата на обхват дава решаващо предимство при прецизното разпознаване на АСЕ и че предтренирането на езика в областта е особено полезно, когато трансформаторният модел се обучава само върху биомедицински текст от нулата.', 'nl': "Voorgetrainde transformatormodellen, zoals BERT en zijn varianten, zijn een veelvoorkomende keuze geworden om state-of-the-art prestaties te verkrijgen bij NLP-taken. Bij de identificatie van Adverse Drug Events (ADE) uit social media teksten staan BERT architecturen bijvoorbeeld voorop in het leaderboard. Er is echter nog geen systematische vergelijking tussen deze modellen gemaakt. In dit artikel willen we licht werpen op de verschillen tussen hun prestaties door de resultaten van 12-modellen te analyseren, getest op twee standaard benchmarks. SpanBERT en PubMedBERT zijn de beste modellen in onze evaluatie: dit resultaat laat duidelijk zien dat span-based pretraining een doorslaggevend voordeel biedt bij de nauwkeurige herkenning van ADE's, en dat in-domain taalpretraining vooral nuttig is wanneer het transformatormodel alleen op biomedische tekst wordt getraind.", 'da': "Forudtrænede transformatorbaserede modeller, såsom BERT og dens varianter, er blevet et fælles valg for at opnå state-of-the-art præstationer i NLP-opgaver. Ved identificering af bivirkninger (ADE) fra tekster på sociale medier rangerer BERT-arkitekturerne først på ranglisten. Der er imidlertid endnu ikke foretaget en systematisk sammenligning mellem disse modeller. I denne artikel har vi til formål at kaste lys over forskellene mellem deres ydeevne ved at analysere resultaterne af 12 modeller, testet på to standardbenchmarks. SpanBERT og PubMedBERT fremstod som de bedste modeller i vores evaluering: Dette resultat viser tydeligt, at span-baseret forudtræning giver en afgørende fordel i den præcise anerkendelse af ADE'er, og at forudtræning af sprog i domænet er særligt nyttigt, når transformermodellen trænes udelukkende på biomedicinsk tekst fra bunden.", 'hr': 'Preklinjeni modeli na transformaciji, poput BERT i njegovih varianta, postali su zajednički izbor za dobivanje postupnih izvora umjetnosti u zadatku NLP-a. U identifikaciji nuspojavnih događaja droge (ADE) iz teksta društvenih medija, na primjer, arhitekture BERT prvo čine u vodećoj ploči. Međutim, sistematska usporedba između ovih modela još nije urađena. U ovom papiru, ciljevi smo da otkrijemo svjetlo razlike između njihovih rezultata analizirajući rezultate 12 modela, testirane na dva standardna kritika. SpanBERT i PubMedBERT pojavili su se kao najbolji modeli u našoj procjeni: to jasno pokazuje da se prepreka na osnovu razdoblja predstavlja odlučnu prednost u preciznom priznanju ADE-a i da je prepreka jezika u domenu posebno korisna kada se model transformera obučava samo na biomedicinskom tekstu iz ogrebotine.', 'de': 'Vortrainierte transformatorbasierte Modelle, wie BERT und seine Varianten, sind zu einer gängigen Wahl geworden, um State-of-the-Art-Leistungen bei NLP-Aufgaben zu erzielen. Bei der Identifikation von unerwünschten Arzneimittelereignissen (ADE) aus Social-Media-Texten stehen beispielsweise BERT-Architekturen an erster Stelle in der Bestenliste. Ein systematischer Vergleich dieser Modelle wurde jedoch noch nicht durchgeführt. In diesem Beitrag wollen wir Licht auf die Unterschiede zwischen ihren Leistungen werfen, indem wir die Ergebnisse von 12-Modellen analysieren, die an zwei Standardbenchmarks getestet wurden. SpanBERT und PubMedBERT haben sich in unserer Bewertung als beste Modelle herausgestellt: Dieses Ergebnis zeigt deutlich, dass span-based pretraining einen entscheidenden Vorteil bei der präzisen Erkennung von ADEs bietet und dass in-domain language pretraining besonders nützlich ist, wenn das Transformatormodell nur auf biomedizinischen Text von Grund auf trainiert wird.', 'id': 'Model berdasarkan transformer, seperti BERT dan variannya, telah menjadi pilihan umum untuk mendapatkan prestasi terbaik dalam tugas NLP. Dalam identifikasi peristiwa obat-obatan (ADE) dari teks media sosial, misalnya, arsitektur BERT berturut pertama di papan pemimpin. Namun, perbandingan sistematis antara model ini belum dilakukan. Dalam kertas ini, kami bermaksud untuk melemparkan cahaya pada perbedaan antara prestasi mereka menganalisa hasil dari 12 model, diuji pada dua benchmark standar. SpanBERT dan PubMedBERT muncul sebagai model terbaik dalam evaluasi kami: hasil ini jelas menunjukkan bahwa pralatihan berdasarkan jangka memberikan keuntungan yang menentukan dalam pengenal tepat ADE, dan bahwa pralatihan bahasa dalam domain sangat berguna ketika model transformer dilatih hanya pada teks biomedis dari nol.', 'sw': 'Mifano ya mabadiliko yenye msingi wa mabadiliko, kama vile BERT na mabadiliko yake, yamekuwa chaguo la kawaida kupata hali ya sanaa katika kazi za NLP. Katika kutambua matukio ya dawa za kawaida (ADE) kutoka kwenye maandishi ya mitandao ya kijamii, kwa mfano, majengo ya BERT yalikuwa yenye nafasi ya kwanza katika kiongozi. Hata hivyo, ukilinganishwa na mfumo kati ya mifano haya bado haujafanya. Katika karatasi hii, tunakusudia kuonyesha mwangaza juu ya tofauti kati ya utendaji wao wakichambua matokeo ya mifano 12, yaliyojaribiwa kwa misingi miwili ya kawaida. SpanBERT na PubMedBERT walijitokeza kama mifano bora zaidi katika tathmini yetu: matokeo haya yanaonyesha kuwa matumizi ya ukatili yanatoa faida muhimu katika kutambua sahihi ya ADS, na kwamba matumizi ya lugha ya ndani yanakuwa na manufaa hasa pale model ya mabadiliko inapofundishwa kwa kutumia ujumbe wa kitabibu wa kitabibu kutoka kwenye viwanja vya kitabibu.', 'fa': 'Models based on transformer, such as BERT and its variants, have become a common choice to obtain state-of-the-art performances in NLP tasks. در شناسایی اتفاقات مخالف مواد مخالف (ADE) از متن رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی، برای مثال، معماری BERT اول در صفحه رهبر است. با این حال، یک مقایسه سیستم بین این مدل هنوز انجام نشده است. در این کاغذ، ما هدف می\u200cگیریم که نور را از تفاوت بین عملکرد آنها تحلیل نتایج ۱۲ مدل می\u200cکند، که روی دو مقدار استاندارد آزمایش شده است. SpanBERT و PubMedBERT به عنوان بهترین مدل در ارزیابی ما ظاهر شدند: این نتیجه مشخصا نشان می دهد که تغییر بر اساس اسپانیت تغییر بر اساس اسپانیت سودهای تصمیم\u200cگیری در شناسایی دقیق ADEs می\u200cدهد، و این تغییر زبان در دامنه ویژه مفید است وقتی مدل تغییر دهنده فقط بر متن بیوپ', 'tr': 'BERT we onu흫 wariantlary 첵aly transformer tabanl캇 modelleri, NLP g철revlerinde durum-of-the-art eserlerini almak 체챌in orta sa첵law boldy. 횜흫ler챌e narkotik nusgalary흫 (ADE) sosial med첵danlary흫 metinlerinden, mesel창, BERT arhitekterileri ilkinji gezek liderlerde tutarlar. 횦철ne bu nusgalar arasynda sistematik bir kar힊캇la힊yk heniz edilmedi. Bu kagyzda, 12 nusga netijesini 챌ykyp, iki standart benchmarklarda synany힊dyryl첵an 첵agtylaryny 챌ykarmak 체챌in ama챌landyrys. SpanBERT we PubMedBERT aralygymyzdaki i흫 gowy nusgalar bolup ortaya 챌ykdy: bu netijede 챌yky힊 tabanly s체첵tge첵채n s체첵tge첵채n s체첵tge첵채n ADE-lary흫 dogry tanamasynda karar ber첵채n zady g철rkez첵채r we dom채흫 dilinde s체첵tge첵채n s체첵tge첵채n nusgady 챌yky힊 edilen b철legi 철z체ne bi첵a-medici', 'sq': 'Modele me bazë transformuese të parastërvitura, të tilla si BERT dhe variantet e saj, janë bërë një zgjedhje e përbashkët për të marrë shfaqje më të larta në detyrat e NLP. Në identifikimin e Eventeve të Pafavorshme të Drogës (ADE) nga tekstet e medias sociale, për shembull, arkitekturat BERT renditen së pari në bordin kryesor. Megjithatë, një krahasim sistematik midis këtyre modeleve nuk është bërë ende. Në këtë letër, ne synojmë të hedhim dritë mbi dallimet midis performancës së tyre duke analizuar rezultatet e 12 modeleve, të testuar në dy pika standarde. SpanBERT dhe PubMedBERT dolën si modelet më të mira në vlerësimin tonë: ky rezultat tregon qartë se parastërvitja bazuar në zgjatje jep një avantazh vendimtar në njohjen e saktë të ADE-ve dhe se parastërvitja e gjuhës në domeni është veçanërisht e dobishme kur modeli transformues është trajnuar vetëm në tekstin biomedikal nga zero.', 'am': 'እንደዚህ BERT እና ልዩ ልዩኖቹ የተጠቃሚ ለውጦች ምሳሌዎች በNLP ስርዓቶች ውስጥ የ-የ-art ድረ ገጽ ለማግኘት የተለየ ምርጫ ሆነዋል፡፡ ለምሳሌ፣ BERT መሠረት መሠረት በመጀመሪያ በመሪ በመጀመሪያ በመንግሥት ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ እነዚህ ምሳሌዎች መካከል ስርዓት ተሳያየት ገና አልተደረገም፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የ12 ዓይነቶች ውጤቶችን በማስተዋል እና በሁለቱ የደካማነት መለያ ላይ የሚለዩትን መብራት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ስፓንBERT እና ፉብMedBERT በአመሳሳይነታችን የተሻለ ሚድላት ሆነው ይመለሳሉ፤ ይህ ፍጻሜ የስፋን መፍታት የADS ማስታወቂያውን ማስታወቂያ የሚያስፈልጋል፣ የውይይት ቋንቋ መፍጠር በተለየ ብጤት ሞዴል ከሽብርት ጀምሮ በbiomedical ጽሑፍ ላይ እንደተማረከ ነው፡፡', 'af': "Gevorderde transformeerder-gebaseerde modele, soos BERT en sy variante, het 'n gemeenskaplike keuse geword om state-of-the-art-uitvoerings in NLP-opdragte te kry. In die identifikasie van Adverse Drug Events (ADE) van sosiale media tekste, byvoorbeeld, BERT-arkitektuurs rank eerste in die leierbord. Maar 'n systematiese vergelyking tussen hierdie modele is nog nie gedoen nie. In hierdie papier, doen ons doel om lig te skeiding op die verskille tussen hulle prestasie te analyseer die resultate van 12 modele, te testeer op twee standaard benchmarke. SpanBERT en PubMedBERT het voorgekom as die beste modele in ons evaluasie: hierdie resultaat duidelik wys dat span-gebaseerde pretraining 'n besluitbare voordeel gee in die presies herken van ADEs, en dat in-domein taal pretraining is spesifieke nuttig wanneer die transformeermodel net op biomediese teks van skrewe onderrig word.", 'ko': '버트와 변형과 같은 예비 훈련 변압기 기반 모델은 NLP 작업에서 가장 선진적인 성능을 얻을 수 있는 흔한 선택이 되었다.예를 들어 BERT 아키텍처는 소셜미디어 텍스트에서 약물 불량 사건(ADE)을 인식하는 데 있어 순위 1위를 차지했다.그러나 아직 이 모델들을 체계적으로 비교하지 않았다.본고에서 우리는 두 표준 기준에서 테스트된 12개 모델의 결과를 분석함으로써 그들 간의 성능 차이를 밝히는 데 목적을 둔다.SpanBERT와PubMedBERT는 우리의 평가에서 가장 좋은 모델이다. 이 결과는 Span을 바탕으로 하는 예비훈련이ADE의 정확한 식별에 결정적인 장점을 가지고 분야 언어에서transformer모델이 0부터 생물의학 텍스트만을 대상으로 훈련할 때 예비훈련이 특히 유용하다는 것을 분명히 보여준다.', 'hy': 'Առաջին փորձարկումներով հիմնված մոդելները, ինչպիսիք են BER-ը և դրա տարբերակները, դառնում են ընդհանուր ընտրություն, որպեսզի ստանան նորագույն արտադրություններ ՆԼՊ-ի գործերում: Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների տեքստերից ստացված Արժանի դեպքերի (ADE) հայտնաբերման մեջ, օրինակ, BER ճարտարապետությունները առաջինը դասակարգում են առաջնորդում: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս մոդելների միջև սիստեմատիկ համեմատությունը դեռ չի արվել: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նպատակում ենք լույս տալ նրանց արտադրողության տարբերությունների վրա, որոնք վերլուծում են 12 մոդելների արդյունքները, փորձարկվում են երկու ստանդարտ հարաբերական նպատակներով: Իսպանբերթը և Պուբմեդբերթը հայտնվեցին մեր գնահատման լավագույն մոդելներով: Այս արդյունքը ակնհայտորեն ցույց է տալիս, որ սպանման հիմնված նախադասությունը որոշակի առավելություն է տալիս ADE-ների ճշգրիտ ճանաչության մեջ, և որ տիեզերական լեզուների նախադասությունը հատկապես օգտակար է, երբ վերափոխողի', 'az': 'BERT v…ô onun variablarńĪ kimi transformer-tabanlńĪ modell…ôri NLP iŇül…ôrind…ô sanat performanslarńĪnńĪ almaq √ľ√ß√ľn ortaq se√ßim oldular. √Ėrneńüin, BERT arhitektarlarńĪ ilk d…ôf…ô liderboarda d…ôr…ôc…ô verir. Ancaq bu modell…ôrin arasńĪndakńĪ sistematik bir karŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrma hen√ľz edilm…ômiŇüdir. Bu kańüńĪzda, 12 modell…ôrin sonu√ßlarńĪnńĪ analiz etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn onlarńĪn performanslarńĪ arasńĪndakńĪ f…ôrqli iŇüńĪq √ß…ôkm…ôy…ô niyy…ôt edirik, iki standart benchmarkla imtahana √ß…ôkildik. SpanBERT v…ô PubMedBERT deńüerlendirm…ôkd…ô …ôn yaxŇüńĪ modell…ôr kimi ortaya √ßńĪxdńĪlar: bu n…ôtic…ô a √ßńĪq-aydńĪn g√∂st…ôrir ki, span-based pretraining ADE-l…ôrin preciz tanńĪdńĪqlarńĪnda q…ôrarlńĪ faydasńĪ verir, v…ô domeind…ô dil pretraining √∂zl…ôrin…ô faydasńĪ olduńüuna g√∂r…ô, transformer modeli sadece biyomedicini metin…ô t…ôhsil edilir.', 'bn': 'প্রশিক্ষণিত পরিবর্তনের ভিত্তিক মডেল, যেমন BERT এবং এর ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিত্তিক মডেল, এনএলপি কাজে রাষ্ট্রের শিল্পের প্রদর্শনের জন্য সাধ উদাহরণস্বরূপ সামাজিক মিডিয়া টেক্সট থেকে এডভার্স মাদক ঘটনার (এডি) চিহ্নিত করার ক্ষেত্রে নেতৃত্বে বিবেরেটি স্থাপনাগ তবে এই মডেলের মধ্যে সিস্টেমিক তুলনা এখনও করা হয়নি। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা লক্ষ্য করছি তাদের পার্থক্যের বিষয়টি বিশ্লেষণ করার জন্য তাদের ১২ মডেলের ফলাফল, দুই স্ট্যান্ডার্ড বেনম্যাক স্প্যান্বার্ট এবং পুবমেডবার্টি আমাদের মূল্যের সবচেয়ে ভাল মডেল হিসেবে উঠেছে: এর ফলে পরিষ্কার করে দেখা যাচ্ছে যে স্প্যান ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক বৃষ্টি এডিএসের সঠিক স্বীকৃতি প্রদান করার জন্য একটি', 'ca': "Pretrained transformer-based models, such as BERT and its variants, have become a common choice to obtain state-of-the-art performances in NLP tasks.  En la identificació d'Events Adverse Drug (ADE) dels textos dels mitjans socials, per exemple, les arquitectures BERT es ranken primer a la taula principal. Però encara no s'ha fet una comparació sistemàtica entre aquests models. En aquest paper, volem deixar llum sobre les diferències entre el seu rendiment analitzant els resultats de 12 models, testats amb dos punts de referència estándar. SpanBERT i PubMedBERT van aparèixer com els millors models de la nostra evaluació: aquest resultat demostra clarament que la pré-capacitació basada en l'amplitud dóna un avantatge decisiu en el reconeixement precís de les ADE, i que la pré-capacitació en el domini és particularment útil quan el model transformador està entrenat només en text biomèdic de zero.", 'cs': 'Předtrénované modely založené na transformátorech, jako je BERT a jeho varianty, se staly běžnou volbou pro získání nejmodernějších výkonů v oblasti NLP. Například při identifikaci nežádoucích léčivých událostí (ADE) z textů sociálních médií se architektury BERT nacházejí na prvním místě v žebříčku. Systematické srovnání těchto modelů však dosud nebylo provedeno. V tomto článku se snažíme osvětlit rozdíly mezi jejich výkonností a analyzovat výsledky dvanácti modelů testovaných na dvou standardních benchmarkech. SpanBERT a PubMedBERT se v našem hodnocení staly nejlepšími modely: tento výsledek jasně ukazuje, že předtrénink založený na rozsahu poskytuje rozhodující výhodu při přesném rozpoznání ADE a že předtrénink jazyka v doméně je obzvláště užitečný, pokud je model transformátoru trénován pouze na biomedicínském textu od nuly.', 'et': 'Eeltreenitud trafopõhised mudelid, nagu BERT ja selle variandid, on muutunud tavaliseks valikuks, et saavutada NLP ülesannetes tipptasemel tulemusi. Näiteks sotsiaalmeedia tekstidest saadud kõrvaltoimete tuvastamisel on BERT arhitektuurid edetabelis esikohal. Nende mudelite süstemaatilist võrdlust ei ole siiski veel tehtud. Käesolevas töös püüame valgustada erinevusi nende jõudluse vahel analüüsides 12 mudeli tulemusi, mida testiti kahel standardsel võrdlusnäitajal. Meie hindamisel ilmnesid parimad mudelid SpanBERT ja PubMedBERT: see tulemus näitab selgelt, et span-põhine eeltreening annab otsustava eelise ADE täpsel tuvastamisel ja et domeenisisene keele eeltreening on eriti kasulik juhul, kui transformaatormudelit koolitatakse algusest peale biomeditsiinilise teksti.', 'fi': 'Valmiina muuntajapohjaiset mallit, kuten BERT ja sen muunnelmat, ovat tulleet yleiseksi valinnaksi saada huipputason suorituskykyä NLP-tehtävissä. Esimerkiksi sosiaalisen median tekstien haittavaikutusten tunnistamisessa BERT-arkkitehtuurit sijoittuvat tulostaulukon kärkeen. Näitä malleja ei kuitenkaan ole vielä vertailtu järjestelmällisesti. Tässä työssä pyrimme valottamaan niiden suorituskyvyn eroja analysoimalla 12 mallin tuloksia, jotka testattiin kahdella standardilla. SpanBERT ja PubMedBERT nousivat arvioinnissamme parhaiksi malleiksi: tämä tulos osoittaa selvästi, että span-pohjainen esikoulutus antaa ratkaisevan edun ADE:ien tarkassa tunnistamisessa ja että kielen esikoulutus on erityisen hyödyllistä, kun muuntajamalli on koulutettu vain biolääketieteelliseen tekstiin tyhjästä.', 'bs': 'Preklinjeni modeli na transformaciji, kao što su BERT i njegovi varianti, postali su zajednički izbor za dobivanje izvedbi stanja umjetnosti u zadatku NLP-a. U identifikaciji nesporaznih događaja droge (ADE) iz tekstova socijalnih medija, na primjer, arhitekture BERT prvo čine u vodećoj ploči. Međutim, sistematska usporedba između ovih modela još nije urađena. U ovom papiru, ciljamo da otkrijemo svjetlo razlike između njihovih rezultata analiziranja rezultata 12 modela, testiranih na dva standardna kritika. SpanBERT i PubMedBERT pojavili su se kao najbolji modeli u našoj procjeni: to jasno pokazuje da se predavanje na osnovu razdoblja predstavlja odlučnu prednost u preciznom priznanju ADE-a, a da je preliječenje jezika u domenu posebno korisno kada se model transformera obučava samo na biomedicinskom tekstu iz ogrebotine.', 'sk': 'Predvadljeni modeli na osnovi transformatorjev, kot je BERT in njegove različice, so postali pogosta izbira za doseganje najsodobnejših izvedb pri nalogah NLP. Pri identifikaciji neželenih dogodkov na drogah (ADE) iz besedil na družbenih omrežjih se na primer arhitekture BERT uvrščajo na prvo mesto v lestvici lestvic. Vendar sistematična primerjava teh modelov še ni bila opravljena. V prispevku želimo osvetliti razlike med njihovo učinkovitostjo in analizirati rezultate 12 modelov, testiranih na dveh standardnih referenčnih vrednostih. SpanBERT in PubMedBERT sta se v našem ocenjevanju pojavila kot najboljša modela: ta rezultat jasno kaže, da predtreniranje na podlagi razpona daje odločilno prednost pri natančnem prepoznavanju ADE in da je predtreniranje jezika v domeni še posebej uporabno, kadar se transformatorski model usposablja samo na biomedicinskem besedilu iz nič.', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis Ina gane wa shiryoyin Ayuka na Nafi (ADE) daga littafan mitandai na jamii, misali, BERT masu matsayi na farko a cikin shirin shiryarwa. A lokacin da ba a sami wani masallaci ba a tsakanin waɗannan. Ga wannan takardan, Munã aimar mu nuna haske a kan sãɓãnin da suka yi rabo a tsakanin matsalan misãlai 12, wanda aka jarraba a kan bangon biyu na daidaita. SpenBERT da PubMedBERT suka bayyana kamar mafi kyaun motel cikin evalucinmu: wannan matsayi ya bayyana a bayani cewa, bakin span-bane misalin ruwa yana da amfani mai sauki ga ganin ADS, kuma a cikin harshen guda, ana da amfani da idan an sanar da shi misalin motsi na shifolio daga matsayin bazariya daga skatch.', 'bo': 'Pretrained transformer-based models, such as BERT and its variants, have become a common choice to obtain state-of-the-art performances in NLP tasks. In the identification of Adverse Drug Events (ADE) from social media texts, for example, BERT architectures rank first in the leaderboard. ཡིན་ནའང་། མ་དབྱིབས་འདི་དག་གི་དབར་གྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཉེས་མཉམ་དུ་བྱུང་མེད་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ལྟ་བུའི་གྲངས་རིམ་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་མཐུན SpanBERT ། PubMedBERT emerged as the best models in our evaluation: this result clearly shows that span-based pretraining gives a decisive advantage in the precise recognition of ADEs, and that in-domain language pretraining is particularly useful when the transformer model is trained just on biomedical text from scratch.', 'jv': 'Jejaring Anyone Nanging, sistematik karo sistematik karo model iki ora bisa ditambah. Awak dhéwé iki, nglanggar nganggo cah-cah dumadhi mikirke sing paling maneh karo hal dadi sampek 12 model, ujian iki bakal kelompok bendhèwèk duwé. SpanBERT karo PubmedBERT tahun ngomong nik akeh model sing luwih apik dhéwé: iki dadi nyimpen kuwi perintah sing is in é, ingkang adalah dhéwé kuwi nggawe barang apik dhéwé, lan padha apik dhéwé, kuwi arep kuwi padha apik dhéwé, kuwi model sing dadi nggawe gerakan oleh dumadhi kuwi nggawe biyoten matsurat.', 'he': 'דוגמנים מבוססים על משתנים, כמו BERT והשונים שלה, הפכו לבחירה משותפת כדי להשיג הופעות חדשות במשימות NLP. בזיהוי אירועי סמים רעים (ADE) מסמכים של מדיה חברתית, לדוגמה, ארכיטקטורות BERT מתייצבות ראשונות בלוח המנהיגה. However, a systematic comparison between these models has not yet been done.  In this paper, we aim at shedding light on the differences between their performance analyzing the results of 12 models, tested on two standard benchmarks.  ספנברט ופאבמדברט הופיעו כדוגמנים הטובים ביותר בערכת הערכה שלנו: התוצאה הזו מראה בבירור שהשימוש מוקדם מבוסס על רחוב נותן יתרון החלטי בהכרה מדויקת של ADE, וששימוש מוקדם בשפה בתחום הוא במיוחד שימושי כאשר המודל המעבר מאומן רק על טקסט ביומדיקלי מאפס.'}
{'en': 'Semantic Parsing of Disfluent Speech', 'fr': 'Analyse sémantique de discours disfluent', 'pt': 'Análise Semântica de Discurso Disfluente', 'ar': 'الاعراب الدلالي للكلام غير المطلق', 'es': 'Análisis semántico del habla disfluente', 'ja': '不流暢な発話のセマンティック構文解析', 'zh': '语音不流者语义解析', 'hi': 'Disfluent Speech का Semantic Parsing', 'ru': 'Семантический анализ нецензурной речи', 'ga': 'Parsáil Shéimeantach ar Urlabhra Eascrach', 'hu': 'A zavartalan beszéd szemantikus értelmezése', 'el': 'Σημματική ανάλυση της δυσδιάκριτης ομιλίας', 'ka': 'სემანტიკური პარამეტრება', 'it': 'Analisi semantica del discorso disfluente', 'kk': 'Орындалмаған сөздерді семантикалық талдау', 'lt': 'Semantinis skysčių kalbos analizavimas', 'ml': 'സെമാന്റിക് സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ്', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл хөдлөлгүй ярианы талаар', 'mk': 'Семантично анализирање на разливлив говор', 'pl': 'Parsowanie semantyczne niepłynnej mowy', 'ms': 'Semantic Parsing of Disfluent Speech', 'mt': 'Analiżi Semantika ta’ Disfluent Speech', 'ro': 'Interpretarea semantică a discursului dezfluent', 'sr': 'Semantičko razmatranje neprijateljskog govora', 'si': 'සෙමැන්ටික් විශ්වාස කතාව', 'no': 'Semantisk tolking av forskjellige tale', 'so': 'Heshiiska naafada', 'ta': 'செமாண்டிக் பாடல் செயல்படாத பேச்சு', 'ur': 'غلط بات کی سیمنٹی پھیری', 'sv': 'Semantisk tolkning av ohälsosamt tal', 'vi': 'Phim truyền đạt thành thạo thạo thạo thạo', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Семантично анализиране на неразположение на речта', 'hr': 'Semantičko razmatranje neprijateljskog govora', 'nl': 'Semantische parsing van disfluent spraak', 'id': 'Analisis Semantik dari Bicara Terbahaya', 'ko': '유창하지 않은 음성의 의미 분석', 'da': 'Semantisk fortolkning af taletalen', 'de': 'Semantisches Parsen von Sprachstörungen', 'fa': 'استفاده از سخنرانی ناپذیر', 'sw': 'Uchapishaji wa Hotuba ya Sipu', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Analizimi Semantik i Fjalës Disfluent', 'tr': 'Taýdalyksyz sözlerin açylmasy', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'ব্যর্থ ভাষণের সেম্যান্ডিক পার্সিং', 'az': 'S톛f톛rqli S칬z칲n Semantik Parsing', 'bs': 'Semantičko razmatranje neprijateljskog govora', 'ca': 'Analització Semàtica de Discursos Disfluents', 'cs': 'Sémantická analýza neslušné řeči', 'et': 'Kõnehäire semantiline parsimine', 'fi': 'Puhehäiriön semanttinen jäsentäminen', 'sk': 'Semantno razporejanje motenega govora', 'jv': 'undo-type', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'འཕགས་རིས་ཀྱི་སྐད་ཆ་ཚོར་ཆུང་ལ་བཤད་པ', 'he': 'מחקר סמנטי של דיבור משוחרר'}
{'en': 'Speech disfluencies are prevalent in spontaneous speech. The rising popularity of voice assistants presents a growing need to handle naturally occurring disfluencies. Semantic parsing is a key component for understanding user utterances in voice assistants, yet most semantic parsing research to date focuses on written text. In this paper, we investigate semantic parsing of disfluent speech with the ATIS dataset. We find that a state-of-the-art semantic parser does not seamlessly handle disfluencies. We experiment with adding real and synthetic disfluencies at training time and find that adding synthetic disfluencies not only improves model performance by up to 39 % but can also outperform adding real disfluencies in the ATIS dataset.', 'es': 'Las disfluencias del habla son frecuentes en el habla espontánea. La creciente popularidad de los asistentes de voz presenta una creciente necesidad de manejar las disfluencias que ocurren naturalmente. El análisis semántico es un componente clave para comprender las expresiones de los usuarios en los asistentes de voz, sin embargo, la mayoría de las investigaciones de análisis semántico hasta la fecha se centran en el texto escrito. En este artículo, investigamos el análisis semántico del habla disfluente con el conjunto de datos ATIS. Descubrimos que un analizador semántico de última generación no maneja sin problemas las disfluencias. Experimentamos con la adición de disfluencias reales y sintéticas en el momento del entrenamiento y descubrimos que la adición de disfluencias sintéticas no solo mejora el rendimiento del modelo en hasta un 39%, sino que también puede superar la adición de disfluencias reales en el conjunto de datos ATIS.', 'fr': "Les troubles de la parole sont fréquents dans les discours spontanés. La popularité croissante des assistants vocaux présente un besoin croissant de gérer les disfluences naturelles. L'analyse sémantique est un élément clé pour comprendre les énoncés des utilisateurs dans les assistants vocaux, mais la plupart des recherches sur l'analyse sémantique à ce jour se concentrent sur le texte écrit. Dans cet article, nous étudions l'analyse sémantique de la parole disfluente à l'aide de l'ensemble de données ATIS. Nous constatons qu'un analyseur sémantique de pointe ne gère pas parfaitement les disfluences. Nous avons expérimenté l'ajout de disfluences réelles et synthétiques au moment de l'entraînement et avons constaté que l'ajout de disfluences synthétiques améliore non seulement les performances du modèle jusqu'à 39\xa0%, mais peut également surpasser l'ajout de disfluences réelles dans l'ensemble de données ATIS.", 'pt': 'As disfluências de fala são prevalentes na fala espontânea. A crescente popularidade dos assistentes de voz apresenta uma necessidade crescente de lidar com disfluências que ocorrem naturalmente. A análise semântica é um componente-chave para entender os enunciados do usuário em assistentes de voz, mas a maioria das pesquisas de análise semântica até o momento se concentra no texto escrito. Neste artigo, investigamos a análise semântica de fala disfluente com o conjunto de dados ATIS. Descobrimos que um analisador semântico de última geração não lida perfeitamente com disfluências. Experimentamos adicionar disfluências reais e sintéticas no tempo de treinamento e descobrimos que adicionar disfluências sintéticas não apenas melhora o desempenho do modelo em até 39%, mas também pode superar a adição de disfluências reais no conjunto de dados ATIS.', 'ar': 'ينتشر عدم إتقان الكلام في الكلام العفوي. تمثل الشعبية المتزايدة للمساعدين الصوتيين حاجة متزايدة للتعامل مع حالات عدم التوافق التي تحدث بشكل طبيعي. يعد التحليل الدلالي مكونًا رئيسيًا لفهم نطق المستخدم في المساعدين الصوتيين ، إلا أن معظم أبحاث التحليل الدلالي حتى الآن تركز على النص المكتوب. في هذه الورقة ، نحقق في التحليل الدلالي للكلام غير المألوف باستخدام مجموعة بيانات ATIS. نجد أن المحلل الدلالي الحديث لا يتعامل بسلاسة مع حالات عدم التوافق. نحن نجرب إضافة أوجه عدم كفاءة حقيقية وصناعية في وقت التدريب ووجدنا أن إضافة أوجه القصور الاصطناعية لا تؤدي فقط إلى تحسين أداء النموذج بنسبة تصل إلى 39٪ ، بل يمكن أيضًا أن تتفوق على إضافة أوجه القصور الحقيقية في مجموعة بيانات ATIS.', 'zh': '言语不流,自发言语普遍存在。 语助者日普,理不流者日益增长。 语义解析者,解语助手用户语之要组件,而迄今为止,多语义解析研集书面文本。 本文,臣等考用ATIS数据集对不流语音之语义解析。 最先进者语义解析器不能无隙处不流。 试于训练加实合成不流畅性,见添合成不畅度不惟可以增模性能增至39%,又可以优于ATIS数集加真不流畅性。', 'hi': 'सहज भाषण में भाषण की विसंगतियां प्रचलित हैं। आवाज सहायकों की बढ़ती लोकप्रियता स्वाभाविक रूप से होने वाली अव्यवस्थाओं को संभालने की बढ़ती आवश्यकता को प्रस्तुत करती है। सिमेंटिक पार्सिंग आवाज सहायकों में उपयोगकर्ता के कथन को समझने के लिए एक महत्वपूर्ण घटक है, फिर भी आज तक के अधिकांश शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग अनुसंधान लिखित पाठ पर केंद्रित हैं। इस पेपर में, हम ATIS डेटासेट के साथ disfluent भाषण के शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग की जांच करते हैं। हम पाते हैं कि एक अत्याधुनिक शब्दार्थ पार्सर निर्बाध रूप से disfluencies को संभाल नहीं करता है। हम प्रशिक्षण के समय में वास्तविक और सिंथेटिक डिस्फ्लुएंसी को जोड़ने के साथ प्रयोग करते हैं और पाते हैं कि सिंथेटिक डिस्फ्लुएंसी जोड़ने से न केवल 39% तक मॉडल प्रदर्शन में सुधार होता है, बल्कि एटीआईएस डेटासेट में वास्तविक डिस्फ्लुएंसीज जोड़ने से भी बेहतर प्रदर्शन कर सकते हैं।', 'ja': '自発性発話では発話不全が一般的である。ボイスアシスタントの人気の高まりは、自然に生じる不流動に対処する必要性を高めています。セマンティック構文解析は、音声アシスタントのユーザー発話を理解するための重要なコンポーネントですが、今日までのほとんどのセマンティック構文解析研究は、書かれたテキストに焦点を当てています。本稿では、ATISデータセットを用いた不流暢な発話の意味解析について検討する。最先端のセマンティック構文解析器では、不確実性をシームレスに処理できないことがわかります。私たちは、トレーニング時間に実在のおよび合成の不整脈を追加することを実験し、合成の不整脈を追加することは、モデルのパフォーマンスを最大39%向上させるだけでなく、ATISデータセットに実在の不整脈を追加することよりも優れたパフォーマンスを得ることができることを発見しました。', 'ru': 'В спонтанной речи преобладают речевые дисфлюенции. Растущая популярность голосовых помощников представляет собой растущую потребность в обработке естественных отклонений. Семантический синтаксический анализ является ключевым компонентом для понимания высказываний пользователей в голосовых помощниках, однако большинство исследований семантического синтаксического анализа на сегодняшний день сосредоточены на письменном тексте. В данной работе мы исследуем семантический разбор неактивной речи с набором данных ATIS. Мы обнаружили, что современный семантический парсер не справляется с дисфлюидами. Мы экспериментируем с добавлением реальных и синтетических отклонений во время обучения и обнаруживаем, что добавление синтетических отклонений не только улучшает производительность модели до 39%, но и может превосходить добавление реальных отклонений в набор данных ATIS.', 'ga': 'Tá éagsúlachtaí cainte coitianta i gcaint spontáineach. Mar gheall ar an méadú atá ag teacht ar an éileamh atá ar chúntóirí gutha, tá gá méadaitheach le héagsúlachtaí nádúrtha a láimhseáil. Cuid lárnach is ea an pharsáil shéimeantach chun cainteanna úsáideoirí i gcúntóirí gutha a thuiscint, ach díríonn an chuid is mó de thaighde parsála shéimeantach go dtí seo ar théacs scríofa. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid imscrúdú ar pharsáil shéimeantach urlabhra easlaigh le tacar sonraí ATIS. Faighimid amach nach láimhseálann parsálaí shéimeantach úrscothach idirdhealú gan uaim. Déanaimid turgnaimh le héagsúlachtaí réadacha agus sintéiseacha a chur leis ag am traenála agus aimsímid go bhfeabhsaítear feidhmíocht na samhla de suas le 39% ní hamháin ach go n-éireoidh sé níos fearr le fíor-difríochtaí breise a chur leis i dtacar sonraí ATIS.', 'hu': 'A spontán beszédben gyakori a beszédzavar. A hangasszisztensek növekvő népszerűsége egyre növekvő igényt jelent a természetesen előforduló diszfluenciák kezelésére. A szemantikus elemzés kulcsfontosságú összetevője a felhasználók hangasszisztensekben történő megértésének, de a legtöbb szemantikus elemzési kutatás az írott szövegre összpontosít. Ebben a tanulmányban a diszfolyékony beszéd szemantikai elemzését vizsgáljuk az ATIS adatkészlettel. Úgy találjuk, hogy egy korszerű szemantikai elemző nem kezeli zökkenőmentesen a diszfluenciákat. Kísérletezünk valós és szintetikus diszfluenciák hozzáadásával edzési időben, és megállapítjuk, hogy a szintetikus diszfluenciák hozzáadása nem csak 39%-kal javítja a modell teljesítményét, hanem túlléphet az ATIS adatkészletben valódi diszfluenciák hozzáadásával is.', 'it': "Le disfluenze vocali sono prevalenti nel discorso spontaneo. La crescente popolarità degli assistenti vocali presenta una crescente necessità di gestire le disfluenze naturali. L'analisi semantica è un componente chiave per comprendere le parole degli utenti negli assistenti vocali, ma la maggior parte delle ricerche di analisi semantica finora si concentra sul testo scritto. In questo articolo, esaminiamo l'analisi semantica del discorso disfluente con il dataset ATIS. Troviamo che un parser semantico all'avanguardia non gestisca perfettamente le disfluenze. Sperimentiamo con l'aggiunta di disfluenze reali e sintetiche durante l'allenamento e scopriamo che l'aggiunta di disfluenze sintetiche non solo migliora le prestazioni del modello fino al 39%, ma può anche superare l'aggiunta di disfluenze reali nel dataset ATIS.", 'el': 'Οι ελλείψεις ομιλίας επικρατούν στην αυθόρμητη ομιλία. Η αυξανόμενη δημοτικότητα των φωνητικών βοηθών παρουσιάζει μια αυξανόμενη ανάγκη αντιμετώπισης φυσικών δυσλειτουργιών. Η σημειακή ανάλυση είναι ένα βασικό στοιχείο για την κατανόηση των προφορών των χρηστών σε φωνητικούς βοηθούς, ωστόσο η περισσότερη έρευνα σημασιολογικής ανάλυσης μέχρι σήμερα επικεντρώνεται στο γραπτό κείμενο. Σε αυτή την εργασία, διερευνούμε τη σημασιολογική ανάλυση της δυσδιάκριτης ομιλίας με το σύνολο δεδομένων ΑΤΙΣ. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι ένας υπερσύγχρονος σημασιολογικός αναλυτής δεν χειρίζεται απρόσκοπτα τις δυσλειτουργίες. Πειραματιζόμαστε με την προσθήκη πραγματικών και συνθετικών ανωμαλιών κατά τη διάρκεια της εκπαίδευσης και διαπιστώνουμε ότι η προσθήκη συνθετικών ανωμαλιών όχι μόνο βελτιώνει την απόδοση του μοντέλου μέχρι 39% αλλά μπορεί επίσης να ξεπεράσει την απόδοση προσθέτοντας πραγματικές ανωμαλίες στο σύνολο δεδομένων.', 'ka': 'სიტყვის განსხვავება სპონტანური სიტყვიში იყოს. სიტყვის აზიანტების პოლიპოლურაცია უფრო დიდის უნდა გადაწყენოთ, რომელიც ნართვის შემდეგ გახდება განსხვავება. Semantic parsing is a key component for understanding user words in voice assistants, but most semantic parsing research to date focuses on written text. ამ დოკუნეში, ჩვენ განსხვავებთ სიმენტიკური განსხვავება ATIS მონაცემების შესახებ. ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ სურათის სიმენტიკური პასენტორი არ უკეთესოდ გამოყენებს განსხვავებას. ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტებით რეალური და სინტეტიური განსხვავებების დამატებით განსხვავებაში და აღმოჩნეთ, რომ სინტეტიური განსხვავებების დამატებით არა მხოლოდ 39% უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უ', 'mk': 'Speech disfluencies are prevalent in spontaneous speech.  The rising popularity of voice assistants presents a growing need to handle naturally occurring disfluencies.  Семантичкото анализирање е клучен компонент за разбирање на изразите на корисниците во гласовните асистенти, но најмногу семантично анализирање досега се фокусира на напишаниот текст. Во овој весник, истражуваме семантично анализирање на разговорот со АТИС податоци. Најдовме дека најсовремениот семантичен анализатор не се справува со неуспешности. Експериментираме со додавање реални и синтетички дифленции во време на тренингот и откриваме дека додавањето синтетички дифленции не само што ја подобрува резултатот на моделот за 39 отсто, туку и може да ги надмине додавањето реални дифленции во АТИС податоците.', 'ms': 'Kegagalan ucapan biasa dalam ucapan spontan. Kegemaran yang meningkat bagi pembantu suara menunjukkan keperluan yang meningkat untuk menangani ketidaksempurnaan yang berlaku secara alami. Penghuraian semantik adalah komponen kunci untuk memahami ungkapan pengguna dalam pembantu suara, tetapi kebanyakan kajian huraian semantik hingga kini fokus pada teks tertulis. In this paper, we investigate semantic parsing of disfluent speech with the ATIS dataset.  Kami mendapati bahawa penghurai semantik state-of-the-art tidak secara senyap mengendalikan cacat. Kami eksperimen dengan menambah kelemahan sejati dan sintetik pada masa latihan dan mencari bahawa menambah kelemahan sintetik tidak hanya meningkatkan prestasi model sehingga 39% tetapi juga dapat melampaui menambah kelemahan sebenar dalam set data ATIS.', 'mt': 'Speech disfluencies are prevalent in spontaneous speech.  Il-popolarità dejjem tikber tal-assistenti tal-vuċi tippreżenta ħtieġa dejjem tikber biex jiġu ttrattati d-diskrepanzi li jseħħu b’mod naturali. L-analiżi semantika hija komponent ewlieni għall-fehim tal-espressjonijiet tal-utenti fl-assistenti tal-vuċi, iżda l-biċċa l-kbira tar-riċerka semantika tal-analiżi sal-lum tiffoka fuq it-test bil-miktub. F’dan id-dokument, ninvestigaw l-analiżijiet semantiċi tad-diskors disfluenti mas-sett tad-dejta tal-ATIS. Aħna nsibu li parser semantiku avvanzat ma jimmaniġġjax mingħajr xkiel id-disfluenzi. Aħna ninsperimentaw biż-żieda ta’ disfluenzi reali u sintetiċi fil-ħin tat-taħriġ u nsibu li ż-żieda ta’ disfluenzi sintetiċi mhux biss ittejjeb il-prestazzjoni tal-mudell b’sa 39% iżda tista’ wkoll taqbeż iż-żieda ta’ disfluenzi reali fis-sett tad-dejta ATIS.', 'kk': 'Сөйлеу өзгерістері автоматты сөйлеп тұрады. Дыбыс көмекшілерінің көпшіліктерінің көпшілігі көпшілігін өзгерту керектігін көрсетеді. Semantic parsing is a key component for understanding user words in voice assistants, but most semantic parsing research to date is focused on written text. Бұл қағазда, ATIS деректер жиынымыз белгілі сөздерді semantic parsing. Біз суреттік семантикалық бақылаушы кездеспейді. Біз тек 39% дегенге дейін үлгілі және синтетикалық өзгерістерді қосу үшін тәжірибелерімізді тәжірибеледік. Сонымен қатар ATIS деректер қорларында шындық өзгерістерді қосу мүмкін емес.', 'lt': 'Kalbos sutrikimai dažnai pasireiškia spontaniškoje kalboje. Didėjantis balso asistentų populiarumas kelia vis didesnį poreikį spręsti natūralius trūkumus. Semantinis analizavimas yra pagrindinis komponentas, skirtas suprasti naudotojų žodžius balso padėjėjais, tačiau dauguma semantinių analizavimo tyrimų iki šiol daugiausia dėmesio skiria rašytiniam tekstui. Šiame dokumente mes tiriame semantišką diskrecijos analizę su ATIS duomenų rinkiniu. Mes suprantame, kad naujausias semantinis analizatorius nenuosekliai tvarko trūkumų. Eksperimentuojame mokymo metu įtraukiant tikrus ir sintetinius trūkumus ir nustatome, kad sintetinių trūkumų įtraukimas ne tik pagerina modelio veiklos rezultatus iki 39 %, bet ir gali viršyti tikrų trūkumų įtraukimą į ATIS duomenų rinkinį.', 'ml': 'സ്വയം സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംസാരത്തില്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന അസാധാരണയാണ്. സ്വാഭാവികമായി സംഭവിക്കുന്ന വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യേണ്ടതിനുള്ള ശബ്ദം സഹായികളുടെ വളരെ പ്രധാനപ ശബ്ദ സഹായികളില്\u200d ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് ഒരു കീക്ക് ഘ In this paper, we investigate semantic parsing of disfluent speech with the ATIS dataset.  ഒരു സെമാന്റിക്ക് സെമാന്റിക്ക് പരിപാടിയുടെ സ്ഥിതിയാണെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് തോന്നുന്നു പരിശീലന സമയത്ത് യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ വ്യത്യാസവും സങ്കീര്\u200dത്തിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നത് മോഡല്\u200d പ്രകടനം മാത്രമല്ല, മാത്', 'ro': 'Disfluenţele vorbirii sunt predominante în vorbirea spontană. Popularitatea crescândă a asistenților de voce prezintă o nevoie tot mai mare de a gestiona disfluențele naturale. Analizarea semantică este o componentă cheie pentru înțelegerea declarațiilor utilizatorilor în asistenții vocali, dar cele mai multe cercetări de analizare semantică de până în prezent se concentrează pe textul scris. În această lucrare, investigăm analizarea semantică a discursului disfluent cu setul de date ATIS. Considerăm că un parser semantic de ultimă generație nu gestionează fără probleme disfluențele. Experimentăm adăugarea disfluențelor reale și sintetice în timpul antrenamentului și constatăm că adăugarea disfluențelor sintetice nu numai că îmbunătățește performanța modelului cu până la 39%, dar poate, de asemenea, depăși adăugarea disfluențelor reale în setul de date ATIS.', 'sr': 'Nedostajanja govora prevladaju spontanom govoru. Povećana popularnost glasovnih asistenta predstavlja rastuću potrebu za rješavanje prirodno pojavljivih neprijatelja. Semantičko analiziranje je ključna komponenta za razumevanje govora korisnika u glasnim asistentima, ali većin a semantičkih istraživanja do sada se fokusira na pisani tekst. U ovom papiru istražujemo semantičko analiziranje neprijatnog govora sa ATIS podacima. Pronašli smo da semantički analitičar umetnosti ne podnosi neprijateljstvo. Eksperimentiramo s dodavanjem pravih i sintetičkih nedostataka u treningu i otkrivamo da dodavanje sintetičkih nedostataka ne samo poboljšava modelnu funkciju do 39%, već i mogu da iznesemo i dodavanje pravih nedostataka u setu podataka ATIS-a.', 'si': 'කතාවක් වැරැද්දක් ස්පොන්ටන් කතාවක් වලින් විශ්වාස කරනවා. ශබ්ද සහායකයෝ විශ්වාස කරනවා ස්වභාවික විශ්වාසයෙන් වැඩිය අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්න ඕන. සෙමැන්ටික් විශ්ලේෂණය තමයි භාවිතා කතාවක් තේරුම් ගන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, නමුත් විශේෂ විශ්ලේෂණය මේ පත්තරේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ ATIS දත්ත සෙට් එක්ක සිමාන්තික විශ්වාස කරන්න. අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ ඇත්ත සහ සංවිධානයක් සම්පූර්ණ වෙලාවේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ඇත්ත සහ සංවිධානයක් සම්පූර්ණ වෙනුවෙන් සම්පූර්ණ ව', 'pl': 'Niepłynność mowy jest powszechna w mowie spontanicznej. Rosnąca popularność asystentów głosowych stwarza rosnącą potrzebę radzenia sobie z naturalnie występującymi niepłynnościami. Parsowanie semantyczne jest kluczowym elementem do zrozumienia wypowiedzi użytkowników w asystentach głosowych, jednak większość dotychczasowych badań nad parsowaniem semantycznym skupia się na tekstie pisanym. W niniejszym artykule badamy parsowanie semantyczne niepłynnej mowy za pomocą zbioru danych ATIS. Stwierdzimy, że najnowocześniejszy parser semantyczny nie radzi sobie płynnie z dysfunkcjami. Eksperymentujemy z dodawaniem rzeczywistych i syntetycznych dysfluencji w czasie treningu i stwierdzamy, że dodanie syntetycznych dysfluencji nie tylko poprawia wydajność modelu o maksymalnie 39% ale może również przewyższyć dodawanie rzeczywistych dysfluencji w zbiorze danych ATIS.', 'mn': 'Үйлдлийн буруу байдал сэтгэл хөдлөлд байдаг. Дууслын тусламжийн нэр хүндрэл нь байгалийн алдагдлыг зохицуулах хэрэгтэй болдог. Semantic parsing is an essential component for understanding user voices assistants. But most semantic parsing research up to now is focused on written text. Энэ цаасан дээр бид ATIS өгөгдлийн сангаар буруу ярианы semantic хуваалцааны судалгааг судалж байна. Бид урлагийн шинжлэх ухааны хуваагч нь буруу зүйлсийг хямрал зохицуулж чадахгүй гэдгийг олж мэднэ. Бид сургалтын цаг хугацаанд жинхэнэ болон синтетик буруу нэмэх туршилтыг хийж, синтетик буруу буруу нь зөвхөн 39% хүртэл загварын үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулж чадахгүй гэхдээ ATIS өгөгдлийн санд жинхэнэ буруу нэмэх боломжтой бол', 'no': 'Talforskjellingar er utbredt i spontane tale. Den økende populariteten av stemmeassistentar viser ein økende treng for å handtera naturlige forskjellingar. Semantisk tolking er ein nøkkelkomponent for å forstå brukarstaler i stemmeassistentar, men dei fleste semantiske tolking forskningar til dag fokuserer på skriven tekst. I denne papiret undersøker vi semantisk tolking av disfluent tale med ATIS-datasettet. Vi finn at ein semantisk analyser av kunsten ikkje handterer forskjellingar. Vi eksperimenterer med å leggja til reale og syntetiske forskjeller på treningstid og finn at legging til syntetiske forskjeller ikkje berre forbetrar modelleutviklinga med opp til 39 %, men kan også utføra å leggja til reale forskjeller i ATIS-datasettet.', 'sv': 'Talsvårigheter är vanligt förekommande i spontant tal. Den ökande populariteten hos röstassistenter innebär ett växande behov av att hantera naturligt förekommande diskfluenser. Semantisk tolkning är en viktig komponent för att förstå användarnas yttranden i röstassistenter, men de flesta semantiska tolkningsforskningar hittills fokuserar på skriven text. I denna uppsats undersöker vi semantisk tolkning av disflytande tal med ATIS datauppsättningen. Vi finner att en state-of-the-art semantisk parser inte sömlöst hanterar disfluenser. Vi experimenterar med att lägga till verkliga och syntetiska disfluenser vid träningstillfället och upptäcker att tillägg av syntetiska disfluenser inte bara förbättrar modellprestanda med upp till 39%, utan kan också överträffa att lägga till verkliga disfluenser i ATIS datauppsättningen.', 'so': "Shaqonimo hadalku waa mid af iskaa ah. Dadka caawiyayaasha codka ah oo koraya ayaa soo saara baahida koritaanka oo u baahan in ay dabiicadda ka shaqeeyaan khilaaf. Baaritaanka Semantic waa qayb muhiim ah oo ay fahamaan hadallada isticmaalayaasha ee codka, laakiin waxbarashada baaritaanka ee badnaan ilaa waqtiga la qoray waxay ku kalsoonaadaan qoraal. Warqaddan waxaynu baaritaannaa baaritaanka semantika ah ee hadalka aan qalloocinayn, waxaana ku baaraynaa taariikhda ATIS. Waxaynu ognahay in xaaladda farshaxanka ah aan si caadi ah u qabanayn khiyaano. Waxaynu tijaabinaynaa in lagu sii daro faa'iido dhab ah oo la mid ah xilliga waxbarashada, waxaynu ognahay in ku darsameynta qallafsanaanshaha muusikada oo kaliya uu kordhiyo ugu badnaan karo ugu badnaan karo 39% laakiin sidoo kale wuxuu ku dari karaa dhibaatooyin dhab ah oo ku dari karta ATIS.", 'ta': 'பேச்சு பிரச்சனைகள் தானியங்கிய பேச்சில் முன்னிலையானது. குரல் உதவியாளர்களின் அதிகரிப்பு பிரச்சனை கூறுகிறது இயற்கையாக நடக்கும் தேவையை கையாள வேண்டும். செமாண்டிக் பாசிங் என்பது குரல் உதவிகளில் பயனர் சொல்லுகளை புரிந்து கொள்ளும் விசை பாகம், ஆனால் பெரும்பாலான பாடல் ஆராய்ச In this paper, we investigate semantic parsing of disfluent speech with the ATIS dataset.  நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்க வேண்டும் என்றால் ஒரு நிலையில் இருந்து பெமான்டிக் பிரச்சினைகள் முழுமையாக கையாள பயிற்சி நேரத்தில் உண்மையான மற்றும் ஒத்திசைவுகளை சேர்த்துக் கொண்டு நாம் சோதனைப்படுத்துகிறோம் மற்றும் கூட்டும் தொடர்புடைய துண்டிப்புகளை கூட்', 'ur': 'باتوں کی ناپسند باتوں میں زیادہ سخت ہے آواز مددگاروں کی بڑی جماعت ایک بڑی ضرورت ہے کہ طبیعی طور پر اتر پڑے ہوئے غلطی کے باعث استعمال کرے۔ سیمنٹی پارسینگ آواز مددگاروں میں استعمال کی باتوں کو سمجھنے کے لئے ایک کلی قسمت ہے، لیکن اکثر سیمنٹی پارسینگ تحقیقات تازگی تک لکھی ہوئی متن پر تمرکز کرتی ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم نے ATIS ڈیٹ سٹ کے ساتھ ناپسندیدہ سخنرانی کی سیمنٹی پارسی کی تحقیق کی۔ ہمیں معلوم ہے کہ ایک آهنگ کی سیمانتیک پارچر بے حیائی کے ساتھ تخلیق نہیں کرتا۔ ہم تدریس وقت میں حقیقی اور سینٹیسی غلطی اضافہ کرنے کے ساتھ آزمائش کرتے ہیں اور دیکھتے ہیں کہ سینٹیسی غلطی اضافہ کرنا صرف 39% کے ذریعہ موڈل کی فعالیت کو اضافہ نہیں کرتا بلکہ یہ بھی ATIS ڈیٹسٹ میں حقیقی غلطی اضافہ کرسکتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Бу сўз эҳтиёт сўзидан фойдаланишдир. Tovush yordamchilarining ko'payishi, tabiiy sodir bo'lgan murakkablarini boshqarish kerak. Name Bu qogʻozda ATIS maʼlumotlari bilan hech qanday gapirishni o'rganamiz. Biz o'ylaymiz, sananing holati semantik parametrlarini o'rtacha o'zgarishni o'ylamaydi. Biz o'rganish vaqtda haqiqiqiy va syntetik murakkablarini qoʻshish bilan tajriba qilamiz va o'ylab ko'rib chiqqamiz mumkin, buni faqat 39% foydalanishini oshirish mumkin, balki ATIS maʼlumotlarida haqiqiqiy muammolarni qoʻshish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Phát biểu phổ biến trong ngôn ngữ tự phát. Giọng nói trợ lý ngày càng phổ biến càng cần phải xử lý các biến cố tự nhiên xảy ra. Phân tích trung học là một thành phần quan trọng cho việc hiểu người dùng nói chuyện trong các trợ lý giọng nói, nhưng hầu hết các nghiên cứu phân tích ngữ nghĩa hiện thời chỉ tập trung vào văn bản. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi điều tra ngữ nghĩa phân tích ngôn ngữ không thông thạo với bộ dữ liệu ATS. Chúng tôi thấy rằng một nhà phân tích ngữ pháp hiện đại không giải quyết các biến cố. Chúng tôi thử nghiệm với việc thêm bất dịch thật và tổng hợp vào thời gian huấn luyện và phát hiện ra rằng thêm các chia rẽ tổng hợp không chỉ cải thiện hiệu suất mô hình cho đến 397. mà còn có thể thắng thêm các biến số không thật trong bộ dữ liệu ATS.', 'bg': 'Речните дисfluências са преобладаващи при спонтанната реч. Нарастващата популярност на гласовите асистенти представлява нарастваща нужда от справяне с естествено срещаните дисклуенции. Семантичното анализиране е ключов компонент за разбиране на потребителските изказвания в гласови асистенти, но повечето семантични анализи до момента се фокусират върху писмен текст. В настоящата статия изследваме семантичното анализиране на дискуфорна реч с набор от данни ATIS. Намираме, че най-съвременният семантичен анализатор не обработва безпроблемно дискуфориите. Експериментираме с добавяне на реални и синтетични дисфлуанси по време на тренировка и откриваме, че добавянето на синтетични дисфлуанси не само подобрява производителността на модела с до 39%, но и може да надмине добавянето на реални дисфлуанси в набора от данни.', 'hr': 'Poremećaji govora prevazicioni su u spontanom govoru. Povećana popularnost glasovnih asistenata predstavlja rastuću potrebu za rješavanjem prirodne nedostatke. Semantičko analiziranje je ključna komponenta za razumijevanje govora korisnika u glasnim asistentima, ali većin a semantičkih analiziranja do sada usredotoči se na pisani tekst. U ovom papiru istražujemo semantičko analiziranje neprijatnog govora s ATIS podacima. Pronašli smo da semantički analitičar umjetnosti ne podnosi neprijatnost. Eksperimentiramo s dodavanjem realnih i sintetičkih nedostataka na vrijeme obuke i otkrivamo da dodavanje sintetičkih nedostataka ne samo poboljšava učinkovitost modela do 39%, nego također može izvršiti i dodavanje pravih nedostataka u ATIS podacima.', 'da': 'Talediskløshed er udbredt i spontan tale. Den stigende popularitet af stemmeassistenter giver et stigende behov for at håndtere naturligt forekommende diskfluenser. Semantisk parsing er en vigtig komponent til at forstå brugernes udtalelser i stemmeassistenter, men de fleste semantiske parsing forskning til dato fokuserer på skriftlig tekst. I dette arbejde undersøger vi semantisk fortolkning af diskflydende tale med ATIS datasættet. Vi finder ud af, at en state-of-the-art semantisk fortolker ikke problemfrit håndterer diskfluenser. Vi eksperimenterer med at tilføje reelle og syntetiske diskfluenser på træningstiden og finder ud af, at tilføjelse af syntetiske diskfluenser ikke kun forbedrer modellens ydeevne med op til 39%, men kan også overgå tilføjelse af reelle diskfluenser i ATIS datasættet.', 'nl': 'Spraakafwijkingen komen voor in spontane spraak. De toenemende populariteit van spraakassistenten zorgt voor een groeiende behoefte om natuurlijk voorkomende disfluences aan te pakken. Semantische parsing is een belangrijk onderdeel voor het begrijpen van gebruikersuitingen in spraakassistenten, maar het meeste semantische parsing onderzoek tot nu toe richt zich op geschreven tekst. In dit artikel onderzoeken we semantisch parsen van disfluent spraak met de ATIS dataset. We merken dat een state-of-the-art semantische parser niet naadloos omgaat met disfluences. We experimenteren met het toevoegen van echte en synthetische disfluenties tijdens de training en vinden dat het toevoegen van synthetische disfluenties niet alleen de prestaties van het model verbetert met maximaal 39% maar ook het toevoegen van echte disfluenties in de ATIS dataset kan overtreffen.', 'ko': '언어 장애는 자발적인 언어에 보편적으로 존재한다.음성 조수가 갈수록 인기를 끌면서 사람들은 자연적으로 발생하는 불유창함을 처리해야 한다.의미 분석은 음성 조수에서 사용자의 말을 이해하는 관건적인 구성 부분이지만 지금까지 대부분의 의미 분석 연구는 서면 텍스트에 집중되었다.본고는 ATIS 데이터 집합을 이용하여 유창하지 않은 음성의 의미 분석을 연구했다.우리는 가장 선진적인 의미 해석기가 틈새 없이 원활하게 처리되지 못한다는 것을 발견했다.우리는 훈련할 때 진실성과 합성 불유창성을 첨가하여 실험을 진행하였는데 합성 불유창성을 첨가하면 모델의 성능을 39%까지 높일 수 있을 뿐만 아니라 ATIS 데이터에 진실성 불유창성을 집중적으로 첨가하는 것보다 낫다는 것을 발견하였다.', 'fa': 'تفاوت سخنرانی در سخنرانی استفاده می\u200cشود. شهرت افزایش دستیاران صدا نیازی افزایش را برای رسیدن به اختلافات طبیعی نشان می دهد. بررسی سیمانتیک یک بخش کلید برای فهمیدن کلمات کاربر در دستیاران صدا است، ولی بیشتر تحقیقات بررسی سیمانتیک تا الان روی متن نوشته تمرکز می\u200cکند. در این کاغذ، ما تحقیق قطعه\u200cای semantic از سخنرانی ناپذیر با مجموعه داده\u200cهای ATIS تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. ما فهمیدیم که یک بازیگر سیمانتیک هنری به طور بی\u200cنظیر تغییرات را حل نمی\u200cکند. ما در زمان آموزش آزمایش می کنیم با اضافه تغییرات واقعی و سینتیکی در زمان آموزش و پیدا می کنیم که اضافه کردن تغییرات سینتیکی نه تنها عملکرد مدل را به حدود ۳۹ درصد بهتر می کند بلکه می تواند اضافه کردن تغییرات واقعی در مجموعه داده های ATIS انجام دهد', 'de': 'Sprachstörungen sind in der Spontansprache vorherrschend. Die steigende Beliebtheit von Sprachassistenten stellt ein wachsendes Bedürfnis dar, natürlich auftretende Störungen zu bewältigen. Semantisches Parsen ist eine Schlüsselkomponente für das Verständnis von Äußerungen von Benutzern in Sprachassistenten, aber die meisten semantischen Parsen Forschung konzentriert sich bisher auf geschriebenen Text. In dieser Arbeit untersuchen wir das semantische Parsen von disfluenten Sprache mit dem ATIS Datensatz. Wir stellen fest, dass ein hochmoderner semantischer Parser nicht nahtlos mit Diskluenzen umgeht. Wir experimentieren mit dem Hinzufügen von realen und synthetischen Fehlflüssigkeiten während der Trainingszeit und stellen fest, dass das Hinzufügen von synthetischen Fehlflüssigkeiten nicht nur die Modellleistung um bis zu 39% verbessert, sondern auch das Hinzufügen von realen Fehlflüssigkeiten im ATIS-Datensatz übertreffen kann.', 'id': 'Speech disfluencies are prevalent in spontaneous speech.  Popularitas meningkat asisten suara menunjukkan kebutuhan meningkat untuk menangani cacat yang terjadi secara alami. Penghuraian semantis adalah komponen kunci untuk memahami ungkapan pengguna dalam asisten suara, namun penelitian penghuraian paling semantis hingga saat ini fokus pada teks tertulis. Dalam kertas ini, kami menyelidiki penganalisan semantis pidato yang tidak berguna dengan set data ATIS. Kami menemukan bahwa parser semantis state-of-the-art tidak secara senyap menangani cacat. Kami eksperimen dengan menambahkan gangguan nyata dan sintetis pada waktu latihan dan menemukan bahwa menambahkan gangguan sintetis tidak hanya meningkatkan prestasi model sehingga 39% tetapi juga dapat melampaui menambahkan gangguan nyata di dataset ATIS.', 'af': "Spraak ontbreidings word oorvloedig in spontanee spreek. Die opstandige populariteit van stem assistente stel 'n groei benodig om natuurlik verskynlike ontbreidings te hanteer. Semantiese verwerking is 'n sleutel komponent vir verstaan van gebruiker uitspraak in stem assistente, maar die meeste semantiese verwerking van verwerking tot datum fokus op skryfde teks. In hierdie papier, ons ondersoek semantiese ondersoek van onvloeiende spreek met die ATIS datastel. Ons vind dat 'n staat-van-die-kuns semantiese ontleerder nie selfs behandel afvallighede nie. Ons eksperimenteer met die byvoeg van reële en sintetiese afvallighede by onderwerp tyd en vind dat by die byvoeg van sintetiese afvallighede nie slegs verbeter model uitvoeging by tot 39% maar kan ook uitvoeg by die byvoeg van reële afvallighede in die ATIS datastel.", 'sq': 'Disfluencet e fjalës janë të përhapura në fjalim spontan. Populariteti në rritje i asistentëve të zërit paraqet një nevojë në rritje për të trajtuar mungesat natyrore që ndodhin. Analizimi semantik është një komponent kyç për kuptimin e shprehjeve të përdoruesve në asistentët e zërit, megjithatë kërkimi më semantik për analizimin deri tani përqëndrohet në tekstin e shkruar. Në këtë gazetë, ne hetojmë analizimin semantik të fjalimit të zhgënjyer me dataset ATIS. Ne zbulojmë se një analizues semantik më i avancuar nuk merr me mungesa. Eksperimentojmë me shtimin e mungesave reale dhe sintetike në kohën e stërvitjes dhe zbulojmë se shtimi i mungesave sintetike jo vetëm përmirëson performancën e modelit me deri në 39% por mund të përmirësojë gjithashtu shtimin e mungesave reale në grupin e të dhënave ATIS.', 'sw': 'Ukosefu wa hotuba ni tofauti katika hotuba ya kujitegemea. Kuongezeka kwa umaarufu wa wasaidizi wa sauti inaonyesha haja ya kuongezeka ya kukabiliana na kutokuwepo kwa asili. Uchapishaji wa kimapenzi ni sehemu muhimu ya kuelewa hotuba za watumiaji katika wasaidizi wa sauti, lakini tafiti za uchimbaji wa kimapenzi hadi siku hizi zinajikita kwenye maandishi yaliyoandikwa. In this paper, we investigate semantic parsing of disfluent speech with the ATIS dataset.  Tunapata kwamba mchambuzi wa hali ya aina ya sanaa hawana uwezekano mkubwa. Tunajaribu kuongeza uharibifu wa kweli na pamoja wakati wa mafunzo na kuongeza kwamba kuongeza uharibifu wa pamoja siyo tu kuboresha utendaji wa mifano kwa asilimia 39 lakini pia tunaweza kuongeza uharibifu wa kweli katika seti ya taarifa za ATIS.', 'tr': 'Sözler ýekeýiklikleri spontaýdan çykyş bolýar. Ses kömekçileriniň ýetişdirilip kömekçileriniň täsirli ýagdaýlaryny çykarmak gerek bolýar. Semantik analyzasy ullançy sesi kömekleyicilerinde sözlerini düşünmek üçin wajyp komponentdir, ýöne iň köp semantik analyzasy şu wagt ýazylan metin üçin üns berilýär. Bu kagyzda, ATIS veri seti bilen alyp bilmeýän sözlerin semantik analyzasyny barýarys. Biz sanat semantik täzelikleri boýunça çykyp bilmeýäris. Biz eğitim zamanında gerçek ve sintetik küçükleri eklemek üzere denedik ve syntetik küçükleri toplamak diňe 39% tarafından bu şekilde örnek etkinliğini düzeltmez ama ATIS veri setinde gerçek küçükleri eklemek üzere çözebiliriz.', 'am': 'ንግግር ፍላጎት በሚያሳፍር ንግግር ነው። የድምፅ ደጋፊዎች ቁጥጥር የሚነካውን የፍጥረታዊ ውጤት ለመቀበል የሚያስፈልገውን ያሳያል፡፡ ሴማቲክ ማጋራት የድምፅ ተቃውሞ ለሚያስተውሉ ተጠቃሚዎች ቃላትን ለማስተዋል የቁልፍ ክፍል ነው፤ ነገር ግን እስከ ዛሬ ድረስ አብዛኛዎቹ ተማሪዎችን የጽሑፍ ጽሑፍ ማክሰል ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ በአዲስ ዳታተር ላይ የሽፋን ንግግር ማነጋገርን እናምርመራለን፡፡ የ-አርእስት ሀብት የsemantic ተሳታፊ በተጨማሪው ግንኙነትን በሙሉ እንደማያቆም እናገኛለን፡፡ በአስተማሪው ዘመን እውነተኛ እና የስንቲካዊ ጥላቻን በመጨመር እንሞክራለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Խոսքի անհնարավորությունները տարածվում են ինքնաբուխ խոսքի մեջ: Ձայնային օգնականների աճող բնակչության կարիքը աճում է բնական թերությունների վերաբերյալ: Սեմանտիկ վերլուծությունը ձայնային օգտագործողների խոսքերի հասկանալու կարևոր բաղադրիչ է, սակայն մինչ օրս սեմանտիկ վերլուծությունը կենտրոնանում է գրված տեքստի վրա: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք ATIS-ի տվյալների համակարգի օգնությամբ անհեթեթ խոսքի սեմանտիկ վերլուծությունը: Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ ամենաբարձր սեմանտիկ վերլուծողը անհարմար չի վերահսկում անհնարավորությունները: Մենք փորձում ենք ավելացնել իրական և սինթետիկ թերություններ ուսումնասիրության ժամանակ և հայտնաբերում ենք, որ սինթետիկ թերությունների ավելացումը ոչ միայն բարելավում է մոդելի արտադրողությունը մինչև 39 տոկոսով, այլ նաև կարող է գերազանցել ATIS տվյալների համակարգում իրական թերություններ ավելացումը:', 'az': 'Sözlük boşluqları spontanlıq dilində yayılır. Ses köməkçilərinin yüksək məşhurluğu, doğal olaraq fəsad törətməsi üçün artırmaq üçün çox ehtiyacı göstərir. Semantik ayırma səs köməkçilərində istifadəçilərin sözlərini anlamaq üçün anahtar komponentdir, amma daha çox semantik ayırma araştırması yazılı mətnlərə odaqlanır. Bu kağızda, ATIS veri qutusu ilə müxtəlif sözlərin semantik ayırmasını incidirik. Bizim öyrəndiyimiz kimi, sanat semantik parçacısı təhlükəsizliklərdən çəkinməz. Biz təhsil vaxtında gerçek və sintetik xəstəliyi əlavə etməklə təcrübə edirik və sintetik xəstəliyi əlavə etməklə ancaq 39%-ə qədər modellərin performansını yaxşılaşdırır, lakin ATIS veri qutusunda həqiqət xəstəliyi əlavə edə bilər.', 'bn': 'ভাষণের বিভ্রান্তি স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্রচণ্ড। কণ্ঠস্বর সহকারীদের জনপ্রিয় জনপ্রিয়তা স্বাভাবিকভাবে অস্বাভাবিকভাবে ঘটার প্রয়োজনীয় প্রয়োজন। সেম্যান্টিক পার্সিং হল কণ্ঠস্বর সহকারীদের ব্যবহারকারীর বক্তব্য বুঝতে পারার জন্য একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ অংশ, কিন্তু তারা ল এই পত্রিকায় আমরা সেমেন্টিক পার্সিং বিষয়টি তদন্ত করি ATIS ডাটাসেটের সাথে ভাষণের কথা। আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে একটি শিল্পের সেমান্টিক প্যারেজ সীমাবদ্ধভাবে বিভ্রান্তির ক্ষতি নেই। প্রশিক্ষণের সময়ে আমরা সত্যিকার এবং সিন্টেটিক বিভ্রান্তি যোগ করার পরীক্ষা করছি এবং আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে সিন্টেটিক বিভ্রান্তি যোগ করা শুধুমাত্র ৩৯% মাত্র মডে', 'bs': 'Poremećaji govora prevladaju spontanom govoru. Povećana popularnost glasovnih asistenata predstavlja rastuću potrebu za rješavanjem prirodne nedostatke. Semantičko analiziranje je ključna komponenta za razumijevanje govora korisnika u glasnim asistentima, ali većin a semantičkih istraživanja do sada se fokusira na pisani tekst. U ovom papiru istražujemo semantičko analiziranje neprijatnog govora sa ATIS dataset. Pronašli smo da semantički analitičar umjetnosti ne podnosi neprijatnost. Eksperimentiramo s dodavanjem realnih i sintetičkih nedostataka u trening vremena i otkrivamo da dodavanje sintetičkih nedostataka ne samo poboljšava učinkovitost modela do 39%, nego također može izvršiti i dodavanje realnih nedostataka u ATIS podacima.', 'cs': 'Řečové nerovnosti jsou převládány u spontánní řeči. Rostoucí popularita hlasových asistentů představuje rostoucí potřebu zvládnout přirozeně se vyskytující nesplynulosti. Sémantické parsování je klíčovou součástí pro porozumění uživatelským projevům v hlasových asistentech, avšak většina sémantických parsování se dosud zaměřuje na psaný text. V tomto článku zkoumáme sémantickou parsování neslušné řeči pomocí datové sady ATIS. Zjišťujeme, že nejmodernější sémantický parser nezvládá bezproblémově neslušnosti. Experimentujeme s přidáváním reálných a syntetických disfluencí v době tréninku a zjišťujeme, že přidávání syntetických disfluencí nejen zlepšuje výkon modelu až o 39% , ale může také překonat přidávání reálných disfluencí v datové sadě ATIS.', 'ca': "Les disfluències de la voz prevalen en el discurs espontànic. La creixent popularitat dels assistents de veu representa una necessitat creixent per gestionar les disfluències naturals. L'analització semàntica és un component clau per entendre les expressions dels usuaris en assistents de veu, però la investigació semàntica d'analització fins ara es centra en text escrit. En aquest article investigam l'analització semàntica del discurs desfluent amb el conjunt de dades ATIS. Descobrim que un analitzador semàntic d'última generació no gestiona les disfluències senzillament. Experimentem amb afegir disfluències reals i sintètiques en el temps d'entrenament i descobrim que afegir disfluències sintètiques no només millora el rendiment del model un 39% però també pot superar l'afegir disfluències reals al conjunt de dades ATIS.", 'et': 'Kõnehäired esinevad spontaanses kõnes. Heliassistentide populaarsuse suurenemine toob kaasa kasvava vajaduse käsitleda looduslikke häireid. Semantiline parsimine on võtmekomponent kasutajate väljendite mõistmisel hääleassistides, kuid enamik semantilise parsimise uuringuid on seni keskendunud kirjalikule tekstile. Käesolevas töös uurime disfluentsi kõne semantilist parsimist ATIS andmekogumiga. Leiame, et kaasaegne semantiline parser ei käsitle sujuvalt disfluentseid. Me eksperimenteerime reaalsete ja sünteetiliste disfluentsuste lisamist treeningu ajal ja leiame, et sünteetiliste disfluentsuste lisamine mitte ainult ei paranda mudeli jõudlust kuni 39%, vaid võib ka ületada reaalsete disfluentsuste lisamist ATIS andmekogumisse.', 'fi': 'Puhehäiriöt ovat yleisiä spontaanissa puheissa. Puheavustajien kasvava suosio aiheuttaa kasvavan tarpeen käsitellä luonnollisesti esiintyviä disflunsseja. Semanttinen jäsennys on keskeinen osa käyttäjien sanomien ymmärtämistä ääniavustajissa, mutta suurin osa tähänastisista semanttisista jäsennystutkimuksista keskittyy kirjoitettuun tekstiin. Tässä työssä tutkitaan disfluentin puheen semanttista jäsentämistä ATIS-aineiston avulla. Huomaamme, että huipputekninen semanttinen jäsentäjä ei käsittele häiriötekijöitä saumattomasti. Kokeilemme todellisten ja synteettisten disfluenssien lisäämistä harjoittelun aikana ja huomaamme, että synteettisten disfluenssien lisääminen ei ainoastaan paranna mallin suorituskykyä jopa 39%, vaan voi myös ylittää todellisten disfluenssien lisäämisen ATIS-aineistoon.', 'he': 'הנאום הספונטני גורם לנאום. הפופולריות הגדולה של עוזרי קול מציגה צורך גדול להתמודד עם חסרות התרחשות טבעיות. העבודה סמנטית היא רכיבה מפתחת להבין מילים משתמשים בעוזרים קוליים, אך רוב מחקרי העבודה סמנטית עד היום מתמקדים בטקסט כתוב. בעיתון הזה, אנו חוקרים בדיקת סמנטית של נאום מעורפל עם קבוצת נתונים ATIS. We find that a state-of-the-art semantic parser does not seamlessly handle disfluencies.  אנו מנסים להוסיף חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר חוסר', 'sk': 'Motnje govora so prevladujoče pri spontanem govoru. Naraščajoča priljubljenost glasovnih pomočnikov predstavlja vedno večjo potrebo po obvladovanju naravnih disfluentnosti. Semantično razčlenjevanje je ključna komponenta za razumevanje uporabniških izgovorov v glasovnih pomočnikih, vendar se večina semantičnih raziskav doslej osredotoča na pisno besedilo. V prispevku raziskujemo semantično razčlenitev disfluentnega govora z naborom podatkov ATIS. Ugotovili smo, da najsodobnejši semantični razčlenjevalec ne obravnava disfluentnosti brez težav. Eksperimentiramo z dodajanjem resničnih in sintetičnih disfluenc v času treninga in ugotovimo, da dodajanje sintetičnih disfluenc ne le izboljša zmogljivosti modela za do 39%, temveč lahko tudi preseže dodajanje resničnih disfluenc v naboru podatkov ATIS.', 'bo': 'སྐད་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་འགྱུར་བ་ནི་སྐད་ཆ་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད། སྐད་བརྡ་ཆེན་མཁན་ཚོའི་གྲངས་ཤིང་འཕེལ་བརྙན་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ་སྐྱེལ་བཞིན་པའི་གནད་དོན་ཤིང་དང་། Semantic parsing is a key component for understanding user utterances in voice assistants, but most semantic parsing research to date focuses on written text. ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ATIS ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ཐད་མེད་པའི་སྐད་ཆ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། We find that a state-of-the-art semantic parser does not seamlessly handle disfluencies. ང་ཚོས་དབྱིབས་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་འཛམ་གླིང་སྤྲོ་སྟངས་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྐྱེན་འདུག', 'jv': 'Gosoko kaluwanan ingkang dipungot neng cuwangan popularno sing gak popularno kang dipunangé perbudhakan kuwi dianggap luwih dumadhi cah dumadhi kaé dudu. semanti Nang pemilih iki, kita yatêngkat sematik perusahaan langgambar apa perusahaan AR. text-of-the-arts Awak dhéwé éntuk nambah layang lan pakan-pakan seneng pisan banget kanggo tukang tarjamahan lan nggawe nambah layang seneng pisan-pakan kanggo nambah layang seneng dipun-pakan kanggo nambah layang sampek sing wis atut kanggo nyebuté nggawe Ning% lak maneh, uga iso nggawe nambah layang sak durung maneh dumadhi', 'ha': "Haƙĩƙa, ƙiyayya da magana ita ce mafi girma ga magana. Bayanta umarin mataimaki na sauki na gaya wani haja mai ƙara da ya yi amfani da takwara wa'ura wanda ke faɗa. Parse na Semantic is key compound for an fahimta maganar mai amfani da shi cikin mataimaki na sauci, kuma amma mafi yawansa research na parse zuwa yanzu fokus kan rubũtun littãfi. Ga wannan takardan, Munã karatun parse na semantic da aka yi fassar da bayani na ATIS. Munã gane cewa wani halin-mai-fassarar-da-art bai yi amfani ba a karɓi fassarar. Ana jarrabi da ku ƙara da sharri masu gaskiya da synthetisk a lokacin da za'a yi wa shirin na aikin, kuma tuna cewa, a ƙara iskaffiyar da shirin ayuka ba ta zama kawai mai kyau ga manajan ayuka da up to 39% amma yana iya ƙara fassara masu gaskiya a cikin database na ATIS."}
{'en': 'We Need To Talk About Random Splits', 'es': 'Necesitamos hablar de divisiones aleatorias', 'ar': 'نحن بحاجة للحديث عن الانقسامات العشوائية', 'pt': 'Precisamos falar sobre divisões aleatórias', 'fr': 'Nous devons parler de scissions aléatoires', 'hi': 'हमें यादृच्छिक विभाजन के बारे में बात करने की आवश्यकता है', 'zh': '须谈随机分', 'ja': 'ランダムスプリットについて話す必要があります', 'ru': 'Нам нужно поговорить о случайных сплитах', 'ga': 'Ní mór dúinn labhairt faoi scoilteanna randamacha', 'el': 'Πρέπει να μιλήσουμε για τυχαίες διασπάσεις.', 'hu': 'Beszélnünk kell a véletlenszerű részekről.', 'lt': 'Mums reikia pakalbėti apie atsitiktinius padalijimus', 'ka': 'რპწბგა ეა დჲგჲპთმ ჱა პანესმალნთ ჟოლთრთ.', 'it': 'Dobbiamo parlare di spaccature casuali', 'kk': 'Кездейсоқ бөлу туралы сөйлесу керек', 'mt': 'Jeħtieġ li nitkellmu dwar taqsimiet aleatorji', 'ms': 'Kita perlu bercakap tentang Pembahagian Rawak', 'mk': 'Треба да разговараме за случајни поделби', 'ml': 'നമുക്ക് കുറിച്ച് സംസാരിക്കേണ്ടതുണ്ട്', 'no': 'Vi må snakke om tilfeldige deler', 'mn': 'Бид санамсаргүй хуваагдах талаар ярих хэрэгтэй.', 'pl': 'Musimy porozmawiać o losowych rozdzieleniach', 'sr': 'Moramo razgovarati o Random Splits', 'ro': 'Trebuie să vorbim despre împărţiri aleatorii', 'sv': 'Vi måste prata om slumpmässiga splitter', 'si': 'අපිට කියන්න ඕනේ නැති ස්ප්ලිට් ගැන', 'so': 'Waxan u baahan nahay in aan kala hadlno qaybaha fudud', 'ta': 'குறிப்பில்லாத பிரிவுகளை பற்றி பேச வேண்டும்', 'ur': 'ہمیں راندمین تقسیم کے بارے میں بات کرنے کی ضرورت ہے', 'uz': 'We Need To Talk About Random Splits', 'vi': 'Chúng ta cần nói về những trục trặc ngẫu nhiên.', 'bg': 'Трябва да говорим за случайни разцепвания.', 'hr': 'Moramo razgovarati o Random Splits', 'nl': 'We moeten praten over willekeurige splitsingen', 'da': 'Vi er nødt til at tale om tilfældige splitter', 'ko': '랜덤 분열에 대해서 얘기를 해야 될 것 같아요.', 'de': 'Wir müssen über zufällige Splits reden', 'id': 'Kita perlu berbicara tentang pembagian acak', 'fa': 'ما باید در مورد تقسیم تصادفی صحبت کنیم', 'sw': 'Tunahitaji kuongea kuhusu Kugawanya', 'af': 'Ons moet praat oor willekeurige splittings', 'sq': 'Duhet të flasim për ndarje të rastësishme', 'am': 'ስለ Random Splits', 'hy': 'Մենք պետք է խոսենք պատահական բաժանման մասին,', 'az': 'Biz Random Splits haqqında danışmalıyıq', 'tr': 'Bize tusgadan bölümler barada gepleşmek gerek', 'bn': 'আমাদের অদ্ভুত বিভাগ সম্পর্কে কথা বলতে হবে', 'bs': 'Moramo razgovarati o Random Splits', 'cs': 'Musíme si promluvit o náhodných rozděleních', 'et': 'Me peame rääkima juhuslikest lõhedest.', 'fi': 'Meidän täytyy puhua satunnaisista halkeamista.', 'ca': 'We Need To Talk About Random Splits', 'jv': 'Awakdhéwé kudu perintah Perkara-perintah', 'ha': 'Mun kamata Mu yi magana da Bayani Tsarawa', 'sk': 'Govoriti moramo o naključnih razcepih.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་བྱུང་བ་ཐད་ཀར་སྡེབ་སྐོར་བཤད་དགོས་པ', 'he': 'אנחנו צריכים לדבר על ניתוחים אקראיים'}
{'en': '(CITATION) argued for using random splits rather than standard splits in NLP experiments. We argue that random splits, like standard splits, lead to overly optimistic performance estimates. We can also split data in biased or adversarial ways, e.g., training on short sentences and evaluating on long ones. Biased sampling has been used in domain adaptation to simulate real-world drift ; this is known as the covariate shift assumption. In NLP, however, even worst-case splits, maximizing bias, often under-estimate the error observed on new samples of in-domain data, i.e., the data that models should minimally generalize to at test time. This invalidates the covariate shift assumption. Instead of using multiple random splits, future benchmarks should ideally include multiple, independent test sets instead ; if infeasible, we argue that multiple biased splits leads to more realistic performance estimates than multiple random splits.', 'pt': '(CITATION) defendeu o uso de divisões aleatórias em vez de divisões padrão em experimentos de PNL. Argumentamos que divisões aleatórias, como divisões padrão, levam a estimativas de desempenho excessivamente otimistas. Também podemos dividir os dados de maneiras tendenciosas ou adversas, por exemplo, treinando em frases curtas e avaliando em frases longas. A amostragem tendenciosa tem sido usada na adaptação de domínio para simular a deriva do mundo real; isso é conhecido como a suposição de deslocamento covariável. Na PNL, no entanto, mesmo as divisões de pior caso, maximizando o viés, muitas vezes subestimam o erro observado em novas amostras de dados no domínio, ou seja, os dados para os quais os modelos devem generalizar minimamente no momento do teste. Isso invalida a suposição de deslocamento covariável. Em vez de usar várias divisões aleatórias, os benchmarks futuros devem, idealmente, incluir vários conjuntos de testes independentes; se inviável, argumentamos que várias divisões tendenciosas levam a estimativas de desempenho mais realistas do que várias divisões aleatórias.', 'ar': 'جادل (CITATION) لاستخدام تقسيمات عشوائية بدلاً من تقسيمات قياسية في تجارب البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. نحن نجادل بأن التقسيمات العشوائية ، مثل الانقسامات القياسية ، تؤدي إلى تقديرات أداء مفرطة في التفاؤل. يمكننا أيضًا تقسيم البيانات بطرق متحيزة أو عدائية ، على سبيل المثال ، التدريب على جمل قصيرة وتقييم الجمل الطويلة. تم استخدام أخذ العينات المتحيزة في تكييف المجال لمحاكاة الانجراف في العالم الحقيقي ؛ يُعرف هذا باسم افتراض التحول المتغير. ومع ذلك ، في معالجة اللغات الطبيعية ، حتى الانقسامات في أسوأ الحالات ، وتعظيم التحيز ، وغالبًا ما تقلل من تقدير الخطأ الذي لوحظ في عينات جديدة من بيانات المجال ، أي البيانات التي يجب أن تعممها النماذج إلى الحد الأدنى في وقت الاختبار. هذا يبطل افتراض التحول المتغير. بدلاً من استخدام تقسيمات عشوائية متعددة ، يجب أن تتضمن المعايير المستقبلية بشكل مثالي مجموعات اختبار متعددة ومستقلة بدلاً من ذلك ؛ إذا لم يكن ذلك ممكنًا ، فإننا نجادل بأن الانقسامات المتعددة المنحازة تؤدي إلى تقديرات أداء أكثر واقعية من الانقسامات العشوائية المتعددة.', 'fr': "(CITATION) a plaidé pour l'utilisation de divisions aléatoires plutôt que de divisions standard dans les expériences de PNL. Nous soutenons que les divisions aléatoires, comme les divisions standard, conduisent à des estimations de performance trop optimistes. Nous pouvons également diviser les données de manière biaisée ou contradictoire, par exemple en formant des phrases courtes et en évaluant des phrases longues. L'échantillonnage biaisé a été utilisé dans l'adaptation de domaine pour simuler la dérive dans le monde réel\xa0; c'est ce que l'on appelle l'hypothèse de décalage des covariables. En NLP, cependant, même les divisions les plus défavorables, maximisant le biais, sous-estiment souvent l'erreur observée sur de nouveaux échantillons de données dans le domaine, c'est-à-dire les données auxquelles les modèles devraient généraliser le moins possible au moment du test. Cela invalide l'hypothèse de décalage des covariables. Au lieu d'utiliser plusieurs divisions aléatoires, les futurs benchmarks devraient idéalement inclure plusieurs ensembles de tests indépendants\xa0; si cela est impossible, nous soutenons que plusieurs divisions biaisées conduisent à des estimations de performance plus réalistes que plusieurs divisions aléatoires.", 'es': '(CITATION) argumentó a favor del uso de divisiones aleatorias en lugar de divisiones estándar en los experimentos de PNL. Sostenemos que las divisiones aleatorias, como las divisiones estándar, conducen a estimaciones de rendimiento demasiado optimistas. También podemos dividir los datos de manera sesgada o contradictoria, por ejemplo, entrenando en sentencias cortas y evaluando sentencias largas. El muestreo sesgado se ha utilizado en la adaptación de dominios para simular la deriva del mundo real; esto se conoce como hipótesis de cambio de covariable. Sin embargo, en PNL, incluso las divisiones en el peor de los casos, que maximizan el sesgo, a menudo subestiman el error observado en nuevas muestras de datos dentro del dominio, es decir, los datos a los que los modelos deben generalizar mínimamente en el momento de la prueba. Esto invalida la suposición de cambio de covariable. En lugar de utilizar múltiples divisiones aleatorias, los puntos de referencia futuros deberían incluir en su lugar múltiples conjuntos de pruebas independientes; si no es factible, argumentamos que las divisiones sesgadas múltiples conducen a estimaciones de rendimiento más realistas que las divisiones aleatorias múltiples.', 'zh': '(引文)议于NLP实验中用随机分割而非准则分割。 臣等以为随机拆分(准拆分)致过乐之性。 又以偏对抗性拆分数,训练短句,评长句。 偏倚采样已施域自适,以拟真实世界之漂移。 此之谓协变量移位假设。 然NLP之中,虽至坏分裂,最大化偏差,往往低估域内数样本之差,即模形测试之时,宜最小限度推及之数。 将使协变量移设失效。 未来之准试最宜多独试,非用随机拆分。 若不可,臣等以为多差者拆分比多随机拆分致有实性。', 'ja': '（引用）は、NLP実験で標準分割ではなくランダム分割を使用することを主張した。私たちは、標準的な分割のようなランダムな分割は、過度に楽観的なパフォーマンスの推定につながると主張しています。また、短い文章のトレーニングや長い文章の評価など、偏った方法や対立的な方法でデータを分割することもできます。偏ったサンプリングは、現実世界のドリフトをシミュレートするためにドメイン適応で使用されています。これは、共変量シフト仮定として知られています。しかし、NLPでは、最悪ケースの分割であっても、バイアスを最大化し、多くの場合、ドメイン内データの新しいサンプルで観察された誤差、すなわち、モデルがテスト時に最小限に一般化すべきデータを過小評価する。これにより、共変数シフトの仮定が無効になります。複数のランダムな分割を使用する代わりに、将来のベンチマークは理想的には、複数の独立したテストセットを含める必要があります。実行できない場合、複数の偏った分割は、複数のランダムな分割よりもより現実的なパフォーマンスの推定につながると主張します。', 'hi': '(प्रशस्ति पत्र) एनएलपी प्रयोगों में मानक विभाजन के बजाय यादृच्छिक विभाजन का उपयोग करने के लिए तर्क दिया। हम तर्क देते हैं कि यादृच्छिक विभाजन, मानक विभाजन की तरह, अत्यधिक आशावादी प्रदर्शन अनुमानों का कारण बनते हैं। हम डेटा को पक्षपाती या प्रतिकूल तरीकों से भी विभाजित कर सकते हैं, उदाहरण के लिए, छोटे वाक्यों पर प्रशिक्षण और लंबे समय तक मूल्यांकन करना। वास्तविक दुनिया के बहाव का अनुकरण करने के लिए डोमेन अनुकूलन में पक्षपाती नमूनाकरण का उपयोग किया गया है; इसे कोवरिएट शिफ्ट धारणा के रूप में जाना जाता है। एनएलपी में, हालांकि, यहां तक कि सबसे खराब स्थिति विभाजन, पूर्वाग्रह को अधिकतम करते हुए, अक्सर इन-डोमेन डेटा के नए नमूनों पर देखी गई त्रुटि का अनुमान लगाते हैं, यानी, डेटा जो मॉडल को परीक्षण समय पर न्यूनतम रूप से सामान्यीकृत करना चाहिए। यह कोवरिएट शिफ्ट धारणा को अमान्य करता है। कई यादृच्छिक विभाजन का उपयोग करने के बजाय, भविष्य के बेंचमार्क को आदर्श रूप से इसके बजाय कई, स्वतंत्र परीक्षण सेट शामिल करना चाहिए; यदि संभव नहीं है, तो हम तर्क देते हैं कि कई पक्षपाती विभाजन कई यादृच्छिक विभाजन की तुलना में अधिक यथार्थवादी प्रदर्शन अनुमानों की ओर जाता है।', 'ru': '(ЦИТИРОВАНИЕ) аргументировали использование случайного разделения, а не стандартного разделения в экспериментах NLP. Мы утверждаем, что случайное разделение, как и стандартное разделение, приводит к чрезмерно оптимистичным оценкам эффективности. Мы также можем разделять данные предвзятым или враждебным образом, например, обучение по коротким предложениям и оценка по длинным. Для моделирования дрейфа в реальном мире использовалась предвзятая выборка, известная как допущение ковариатного сдвига. В NLP, однако, даже наихудший случай разделяет, максимизируя смещение, часто недооценивая ошибку, наблюдаемую на новых выборках внутридоменных данных, то есть данных, которые модели должны минимально обобщать во время тестирования. Это делает недействительным допущение о ковариатном сдвиге. Вместо того, чтобы использовать несколько случайных разбиений, будущие контрольные показатели должны в идеале включать несколько независимых тестовых наборов; если это невозможно, мы утверждаем, что несколько смещенных разбиений приводит к более реалистичным оценкам производительности, чем несколько случайных разбиений.', 'ga': 'D’áitigh (LUA) go n-úsáidfí scoilteanna randamacha seachas scoilteanna caighdeánacha i dturgnaimh NLP. Áitímid go mbíonn meastacháin feidhmíochta ró-dhóchasach mar thoradh ar scoilteanna randamacha, cosúil le scoilteanna caighdeánacha. Is féidir linn sonraí a roinnt freisin ar bhealaí claonta nó sáraíochta, m.sh. oiliúint ar abairtí gearra agus meastóireacht a dhéanamh ar abairtí fada. Baineadh úsáid as sampláil claonta in oiriúnú fearainn chun sruth an fhíorshaoil a insamhladh; tugtar an toimhde aistrithe covariate air seo. I NLP, áfach, is minic a dhéanann scoilteanna sa chás is measa, a uasmhéadaíonn an laofacht, tearc-mheastachán a dhéanamh ar an earráid a breathnaíodh ar shamplaí nua de shonraí in-fearainn, i.e., na sonraí ar chóir do shamhlacha ginearálú chomh híseal agus is féidir leo ag am na tástála. Déanann sé seo an toimhde aistrithe covariate a neamhbhailíochtú. In ionad scoilteanna randamacha iolracha a úsáid, ba cheart go hidéalach go gcuimseodh tagarmharcanna todhchaíochtaí iolracha, tacair tástála neamhspleácha; mura bhfuil sé indéanta, áitímid go mbíonn meastacháin feidhmíochta níos réadúla ná scoilteanna randamacha iolracha mar thoradh ar ilroinnteanna claonta.', 'el': '(CITATION) υποστήριξε τη χρήση τυχαίων διαιρέσεων αντί των τυπικών διαιρέσεων σε πειράματα NLP. Υποστηρίζουμε ότι οι τυχαίες διαιρέσεις, όπως οι τυπικές διαιρέσεις, οδηγούν σε υπερβολικά αισιόδοξες εκτιμήσεις απόδοσης. Μπορούμε επίσης να διαιρέσουμε τα δεδομένα με προκατειλημμένους ή αντιφατικούς τρόπους, π.χ. εκπαίδευση σε σύντομες ποινές και αξιολόγηση σε μεγάλες. Η προκατειλημμένη δειγματοληψία χρησιμοποιήθηκε για την προσαρμογή του τομέα για την προσομοίωση της πραγματικής μετατόπισης· αυτό είναι γνωστό ως υπόθεση συμπαραγωγής μετατόπισης. Ωστόσο, ακόμη και οι χειρότερες περιπτώσεις διασπάσεις, μεγιστοποιώντας την προκατάληψη, συχνά υποτιμούν το σφάλμα που παρατηρείται σε νέα δείγματα δεδομένων εντός τομέα, δηλαδή τα δεδομένα στα οποία τα μοντέλα πρέπει να γενικεύσουν ελάχιστα κατά τη διάρκεια της δοκιμής. Αυτό ακυρώνει την υπόθεση της συναλλαγματικής μετατόπισης. Αντί να χρησιμοποιούν πολλαπλές τυχαίες διαιρέσεις, τα μελλοντικά κριτήρια αναφοράς θα πρέπει ιδανικά να περιλαμβάνουν πολλαπλά, ανεξάρτητα σύνολα δοκιμών. αν είναι αδύνατο, υποστηρίζουμε ότι οι πολλαπλές προκατειλημμένες διαιρέσεις οδηγούν σε πιο ρεαλιστικές εκτιμήσεις απόδοσης από τις πολλαπλές τυχαίες διαιρέσεις.', 'hu': '(CITATION) azzal érvelt, hogy az NLP kísérletekben véletlenszerű osztásokat használnak a standard osztások helyett. Azzal érvelünk, hogy a véletlenszerű megosztások, mint a standard megosztások, túlságosan optimista teljesítménybecslésekhez vezetnek. Az adatokat elfogult vagy ellentétes módon is megoszthatjuk, például rövid mondatok képzése és hosszú mondatok értékelése. A tartomány adaptációjában a valós világbeli sodródás szimulálására szánt mintavételt használtak; Ezt kovariáns eltolódási feltételezésnek nevezik. Az NLP-ben azonban még a legrosszabb esetben is, maximalizálva az elfogultságot, gyakran alulbecsülik az új domain adatmintákon megfigyelt hibákat, azaz azokat az adatokat, amelyekre a modelleknek minimálisan általánosítaniuk kell a tesztidőben. Ez érvényteleníti a kovariáns eltolódási feltételezést. A több véletlenszerű felosztás helyett a jövőbeli referenciaértékeknek ideális esetben több, független tesztkészletet kell tartalmazniuk; Ha nem megvalósítható, azzal érvelünk, hogy a többszörös elfogult osztás reálisabb teljesítménybecslésekhez vezet, mint a többszörös véletlenszerű osztás.', 'ka': '(CITATION) აპირგუმენტი გამოყენების გამოყენებაზე, ვიდრე Standardsplits NLP ექსპერიმენტებში. ჩვენ არჩევით, რომ შემდეგ გაყოფილება, როგორც სტანდარტული გაყოფილება, გავაკეთებთ ძალიან ოპტიმისტიური პროცემენტები. ჩვენ შეგვიძლია ასევე გაყოფილი მონაცემები განსაზღვრებული ან განსაზღვრებული გზებით, მაგალითად, კიდევ სიტყვების განაზღვრება და ძალიან განაზღვრება. დიდი მონაცემების გამოყენება დიომინის ადატაციაში გამოყენებულია რეალური მსოფლიოს სიმულაციაში; ეს უცნობიან როგორც კოგარიატიური შეცვლის წარმოდგენა. NLP-ში, მაგრამ, ყველაზე საუკეთესო შეცდომა გაყოფილი, მაქსიმიზაცია წარმოდგენების შეცდომა, რომლებიც მოდელები უნდა გამოცდილოს დროში მინუს გენერალიზაცია. ეს არაფერადებს კოგარიატის შეცვლის წარმოდგენა. მრავალური გამოყენების ნაცვლად, მომავალური ბენქმარკები იდეალურად უნდა ჩატვირთოთ მრავალური, განსაზღვრებული ტესტის ნაცვლად; თუ არაფერიზებელია, ჩვენ აპირებთ, რომ რამდენიმე წინაფერიზებული წინაფერიზებები უფრო რეალიზტიური წინაფერიზება, ვიდრე რამდენიმე წინაფ', 'lt': '(CITATION) teigė, kad NLP eksperimentuose buvo naudojami atsitiktiniai skaidymai, o ne standartiniai skaidymai. Mes teigiame, kad atsitiktiniai padalijimai, kaip ir standartiniai padalijimai, lemia pernelyg optimistinius veiklos vertinimus. Taip pat galime dalyti duomenis pusiausvyriniu ar prieštaringu būdu, pvz., mokymu trumpųjų sakinių ir ilgųjų sakinių vertinimu. Atliekant pritaikymą prie domeno buvo imami dvigubi mėginiai realiajam pasauliui imituoti; tai vadinama kovarinių pokyčių prielaida. Vis dėlto NLP net blogiausiais atvejais pasidalija, didina pusiausvyrą, dažnai nepakankamai įvertina klaidą, pastebėtą naujuose domeninių duomenų pavyzdžiuose, t. y. duomenis, kuriuos modeliai turėtų minimaliai i šplėsti bandymo metu. Tai panaikina prielaidą apie kovarinius pokyčius. Vietoj to, kad būtų naudojami keli atsitiktiniai padalijimai, būsimuose lyginamuosiuose rodikliuose turėtų būti numatyti keli nepriklausomi bandymų rinkiniai; jei jis yra užkrečiamas, mes teigiame, kad keli pusiausvyriniai padalijimai lemia realistiškesnius rezultatų įvertinimus nei keli atsitiktiniai padalijimai.', 'it': "(CITATION) ha sostenuto l'uso di split casuali piuttosto che split standard negli esperimenti NLP. Sosteniamo che le scissioni casuali, come le scissioni standard, portano a stime eccessivamente ottimistiche delle prestazioni. Possiamo anche dividere i dati in modo parziale o contraddittorio, ad esempio, allenarci su frasi brevi e valutare su frasi lunghe. Il campionamento biased è stato utilizzato nell'adattamento del dominio per simulare la deriva nel mondo reale; Questa è nota come assunzione di turni covariati. Nel PNL, tuttavia, anche le divisioni peggiori, massimizzando il bias, spesso sottovalutano l'errore osservato su nuovi campioni di dati in-domain, cioè i dati che i modelli dovrebbero minimamente generalizzare al momento del test. Ciò invalida l'ipotesi di turno covariato. Invece di utilizzare più divisioni casuali, i parametri di riferimento futuri dovrebbero idealmente includere più set di test indipendenti; Se non è possibile, sosteniamo che le divisioni parziali multiple portano a stime più realistiche delle prestazioni rispetto a divisioni casuali multiple.", 'mk': '(ЦИТАЦИЈА) тврдеше за користење на случајни поделби наместо стандардни поделби во NLP експерименти. Ние тврдиме дека случајните раздели, како стандардните раздели, водат до премногу оптимистички проценки на перформансата. Ние, исто така, можеме да ги поделиме податоците на пристрасни или непријателски начини, на пример, обуката за кратки реченици и оценката за долги реченици. Во адаптацијата на доменот за симулирање на движењето на реалниот свет се користи обично примерок; this is known as the covariate shift assumption.  Во НЛП, сепак, дури и најлошите случаи се поделени, максимализирајќи ги предрасудите, честопати ја потценуваат грешката забележана на новите примероци на податоци во доменот, односно податоците на кои моделите треба минимално да се генерализираат во време на тестот. Ова ја невалидира претпоставката за коваријатна смена. Наместо да се користат повеќе случајни поделби, идните референтни оценки треба идеално да вклучуваат повеќе, независни тестови наместо тоа; ако е неприфатливо, тврдиме дека многуте пристрасни делови водат до пореални проценки на перформансата отколку многуте случајни делови.', 'ml': '(CITATION) NLP പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പകരം സ്ഥിരമായ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനായി വാദിച്ചു. നമ്മള്\u200d വാദിക്കുന്നത് സാധാരണ പ്രത്യേകങ്ങള്\u200d പോലെയാണെന്ന്, സാധാരണ പ്രത്യേക പ്രകടനത്തിന്റെ കണക്കിന് മുകള നമുക്ക് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വെറുതെയോ വിരോധമായ വഴികളില്\u200d വിഭജിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും, ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി ചെറിയ വാക്കുകളില്\u200d പരിശീലനം  ബൈസഡ് ടാമ്പിങ്ങ് ഡൊമെന്\u200d ഡാഡാപ്റ്റേഷനില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോകത്തിന്റെ വ്യാപ ഇത് കോവേരിറ്റ് ഷിഫ്റ്റ് ഊഹം എന്നാണ് അറിയപ്പെടുന്നത്. എന്നാലും NLP-ല്\u200d ഏറ്റവും മോശപ്പെട്ട കേസ് സ്പ്ലേറ്റുകള്\u200d പോലും ഏറ്റവും വലുതാക്കുന്നു, ഡോമെയിന്\u200d ഡേറ്റാകളുടെ പുതിയ മാമ്പുകളില്\u200d കണ്ടിട്ടുള്ള പിശക് എണ് ഇത് കോവേരിറ്റ് ഷിഫ്റ്റ് ഊഹം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ഒരുപാട് ക്രമമില്ലാത്ത വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനു പകരം ഭാവിയുടെ ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d ഒരുപാട് സ്വാതന്ത അസാധ്യതയില്ലെങ്കില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d വാദിക്കുന്നത് കൂടുതല്\u200d കുറച്ചു കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രകടനത്തിന്റെ കണക്കിലേക്കാള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d', 'mt': '(CITATION) argumentat għall-użu ta’ qsim każwali minflok qsim standard fl-esperimenti NLP. We argue that random splits, like standard splits, lead to overly optimistic performance estimates.  Jistgħu wkoll inqasmu d-dejta b’modi imparzjali jew avversarji, pereżempju, taħriġ dwar sentenzi qosra u evalwazzjoni fuq sentenzi twal. It-teħid ta’ kampjuni biased intuża fl-adattament tad-dominju biex jissimula t-taqlib fid-dinja reali; dan huwa magħruf bħala s-suppożizzjoni ta’ bidla kovarjata. Madankollu, f’NLP, anke l-agħar każijiet jinqasmu, u l-preġudizzju jiġi massimizzat, spiss jiġi sottostimat l-i żball osservat fuq kampjuni ġodda ta’ dejta fid-dominju, jiġifieri d-dejta li l-mudelli għandhom jiġġeneralizzaw b’mod minimu għal fil-ħin tat-test. Dan invalida s-suppożizzjoni ta’ bidla kovarjata. Minflok ma jintużaw diversi taqsimiet aleatorji, il-punti ta’ riferiment futuri għandhom idealment jinkludu settijiet ta’ testijiet multipli u indipendenti minflok; jekk infeżibbli, nagħmlu l-argument li qsim multiplu bi preġudizzju jwassal għal stimi ta’ prestazzjoni aktar realistiċi minn qsim multiplu każwali.', 'ms': '(CITATION) argued for using random splits rather than standard splits in NLP experiments.  Kami membantah bahawa pecahan rawak, seperti pecahan piawai, membawa kepada perhitungan prestasi yang terlalu optimistik. Kita juga boleh bahagikan data dengan cara bias atau lawan, misalnya latihan pada kalimat pendek dan penilaian pada kalimat panjang. Pengumpulan biased telah digunakan dalam penyesuaian domain untuk simulasi drift dunia-nyata; ini dikenali sebagai asumsi perubahan kovarian. In NLP, however, even worst-case splits, maximizing bias, often under-estimate the error observed on new samples of in-domain data, i.e., the data that models should minimally generalize to at test time.  Ini tidak sah asumsi shift kovarian. Daripada menggunakan pembahagian rawak berbilang, tanda rujukan masa depan patut termasuk set ujian berbilang, bebas selain itu; jika tidak dapat disembunyikan, kita menyangka bahawa pembahagian bias berbilang membawa kepada nilai prestasi yang lebih realistik daripada pembahagian rawak berbilang.', 'mn': 'НЛП туршилтуудын оронд стандарт хуваагдахаас илүү санамсаргүй хуваагдахаас аргуулсан. Бид санамсаргүй хуваагдах нь стандарт хуваагдах шиг үнэхээр өөдрөг үйл ажиллагааны тооцоололтой болдог. Мөн өгөгдлийн талаар эсрэг эсрэг аргаар хувааж болно. Жишээлбэл, богино өгөгдлийн талаар суралцах болон урт хугацааны талаар үнэлэх боломжтой. Дэлхийн хөдөлгөөн шинжлэх ухаан дээр жинхэнэ дэлхийн хөдөлгөөн шинжлэх ухаан дээр хэрэглэгдсэн. Энэ нь ховоариат шилжүүлэх тодорхойлолт гэдэг. Гэхдээ NLP-д хамгийн муу тохиолдол ч хуваагдаж, хамгийн их тохиолдол, ихэвчлэн холбоотой өгөгдлийн шинэ үлгээний алдааны бага зэрэг тооцоолж байдаг. Энэ нь бовариат шилжүүлэх тодорхойлолтыг буруу болгодог. Ихэнх санамсаргүй хэлбэрийг ашиглахын оронд, ирээдүйн хэлбэрүүд санаагаар олон, тогтмол тест хэлбэрүүдийг нэмэгдүүлэх хэрэгтэй. Хэрэв халдваргүй байвал, олон хуваагдах хуваагдах нь олон санамсаргүй хуваагдахаас илүү бодит үйл ажиллагааны тооцоололтой болдог.', 'kk': '(ЦИТАЦИЯ) NLP эксперименттерінде стандартты бөліктерді орнына кездейсоқ бөліктерді қолдану үшін аргументті. Біз кездейсоқ бөліктерді, стандартты бөліктердің сияқты, толық оптимисттік оқиғаларына көмектеседі. Мысалы, қысқа сөйлемелерді және ұзын сөйлемелерді оқытуға және оқытуға болады. Үлкен әлемдік дрифт симулирациялау үшін доменге қолдану үшін қолданылады. бұл ковариат түрлендіру үшін белгілі. Бірақ NLP- де ең үлкен үлкен бөліктерді, көбірек бөліктерді шектеу, домендегі деректердің жаңа үлгілеріне қараған қатенің бағалауын көбірек, мысалы, үлгілерді сынақтағы уақытта төмендету керек деректерін шегінд Бұл ковариатты жылжыту үшін дұрыс емес. Бірнеше кездейсоқ бөлшектерді қолдану орнына, келесі белгілер идеалдығында бірнеше, тәуелсіз сынақтар жиындарын қолдану керек; Бірнеше бөліктердің бірнеше бөліктері кездейсоқ бөліктердің бірнеше бөліктерінің реалистикалық жұмыс оқиғаларынан артық болады.', 'sr': '(CITATION) raspravlja se za upotrebu nasumičnih dijelova umjesto standardnih dijelova u eksperimentima NLP. Svađamo se da nasumični podjeli, poput standardnih podjela, dovede do pretjerano optimističnih procenata uspeha. Možemo podijeliti i podatke na predrasude ili neprijateljski način, npr. obuku kratkih rečenica i procjenu dugih rečenica. Izgleda da je korišteno veoma uzorak u adaptaciji domena za simulaciju stvarnog svijeta; ovo je poznato kao pretpostavka kovarijske smjene. Međutim, u NLP-u čak i najgorim slučajevima, maksimalizirajući pristrasnost, često podcjenjuju pogrešku koja je posmatrana na novim uzorcima podataka u domenu, tj. podataka koje bi modeli trebali minimalno generalizirati na vrijeme testa. Ovo invalidiše pretpostavku kovarijatne smjene. Umesto da koriste višestruke nasumične dijelove, buduće kriterije moraju idealno uključiti višestruke, nezavisne testove umjesto toga; Ako je nevoljno, tvrdimo da višestruki predrasudeni delovi vode do reālističkih procenata učinka nego višestruke nasumične delove.', 'no': '(CITATION) argumentert for å bruka tilfeldige deler i staden for standard deler i NLP- eksperimenter. Vi argumenterer at tilfeldige deler, som standard deler, fører til overoptimistiske utgangsstater. Vi kan også dele data på biased eller adversarial måtar, f.eks. trening på korte setningar og evaluering på lange. Dette er brukt i domenetilpassing for å simulere verkeleg drift. denne er kjent som konariatsforskyvingsassumpsjonen. I NLP er imidlertid også dårlige deler, maksimerer forsiktigheten, ofte under estimerer feilen observert på nye prøver på domenedata, dvs. data som modeller bør minimalisere til testtida. Dette er ugyldige forventinga av kovariatskift. I staden for å bruka fleire tilfeldige deler, bør framtidige benchmarker ideelt inkludere fleire, uavhengige testsett i staden. Dersom det er ikkje sårbar, så argumenterer vi at fleire forskyvingsdeler fører til meir realistiske forskyvingsestimater enn fleire tilfeldige deler.', 'pl': '(CITATION) argumentował za wykorzystaniem losowych podziałów raczej niż standardowych podziałów w eksperymentach NLP. Twierdzimy, że losowe podziały, podobnie jak standardowe podziały, prowadzą do zbyt optymistycznych szacunków wydajności. Możemy również dzielić dane w sposób stronniczy lub przeciwny, np. trenując krótkie zdania i oceniając te długie. W adaptacji domeny w celu symulacji dryfu rzeczywistego wykorzystano pobieranie próbek uprzedzonych; jest to znane jako założenie zmiany współzmiennej. W NLP jednak nawet najgorsze podziały, maksymalizujące biasuny, często niedoceniają błąd obserwowany na nowych próbkach danych wewnątrz domeny, tj. danych, do których modele powinny minimalnie uogólniać w czasie testu. To unieważnia założenie zmiany współzmiennej. Zamiast stosować wiele losowych podziałów, przyszłe wskaźniki referencyjne powinny idealnie obejmować wiele, niezależnych zestawów testów; Jeśli to niemożliwe, twierdzimy, że wiele stronniczych podziałów prowadzi do bardziej realistycznych szacunków wydajności niż wiele losowych podziałów.', 'ro': '(CITATION) a argumentat pentru utilizarea divizărilor aleatorii mai degrabă decât divizărilor standard în experimentele PNL. Susținem că divizările aleatorii, precum divizările standard, duc la estimări excesiv de optimiste ale performanței. De asemenea, putem diviza datele în moduri părtinitoare sau adversare, de exemplu, instruirea pe propoziții scurte și evaluarea pe cele lungi. Eșantionarea cu eșantionare în mod obligatoriu a fost utilizată în adaptarea domeniului pentru a simula derivele din lumea reală; aceasta este cunoscută sub denumirea de ipoteză de schimbare covariată. În PNL, totuși, chiar și divizările cele mai rele cazuri, maximizând părtinirea, adesea subestimează eroarea observată pe noi eșantioane de date în domeniu, adică datele la care modelele ar trebui să generalizeze minim la momentul testării. Acest lucru invalidează ipoteza de schimbare covariată. În loc să se utilizeze mai multe divizări aleatorii, criteriile de referință viitoare ar trebui să includă în mod ideal mai multe seturi de teste independente; Dacă este imposibil, susținem că divizările multiple părtinitoare duc la estimări mai realiste ale performanței decât divizările aleatorii multiple.', 'so': '(CITATION) waxay ku doodeen isticmaalidda burburka ah oo aan ka bilaaban jirrabaadka NLP-ka. Waxaynu ka fekernaa in ay kala soocdo xilli ah, sida goobaha caadiga ah, waxay u leedahay xisaabta rajada ah. We can also split data in biased or adversarial ways, e.g., training on short sentences and evaluating on long ones.  Isticmaalka guriga waxaa lagu isticmaalay si loo simo qalabka caalamiga ah; taasi waxaa lagu magacaabaa malaha isbedelka Si kastaba ha ahaatee NLP xittaa waxaa laga yaabaa inay si weyn u sii kordhaan tababarka, marar badan waxaa lagu qiimeeyaa qalabka samooyinka cusub e e macluumaadka modeladu ay ugu yaraan yihiin inay ugu yaraan sameyn karto wakhtiga imtixaanka. Tani waxay burisaa malaha isbedelka. Isku isticmaalista meelo kala duduwan waxaa habboon in lagu sameeyo kooxo imtixaan oo xor ah. haddii aan la tabaryarayn, waxaynu ka sheekaynaynaa in qayb kala duduwan ay leedahay wax ka badan oo ay ku qiimeeyaan in laga yaabo kala duduwan.', 'sv': '(CITATION) argumenterade för att använda slumpmässiga uppdelningar snarare än standarduppdelningar i NLP-experiment. Vi hävdar att slumpmässiga splitter, som standardsplitter, leder till alltför optimistiska prestandateskattningar. Vi kan också dela upp data på partiska eller motstridiga sätt, t.ex. genom att träna korta meningar och utvärdera långa meningar. Biased provtagning har använts i domänanpassning för att simulera verklig drift. Detta är känt som kovariat skiftantagande. I NLP, dock, även värsta fall splits, maximerande bias, underskattar ofta felet som observerats på nya prov av in-domain data, dvs data som modeller bör minimalt generalisera till vid testtiden. Detta ogiltigförklarar antagandet om kovariat skift. I stället för att använda flera slumpmässiga uppdelningar bör framtida riktmärken i stället innehålla flera oberoende testuppsättningar. Om det är omöjligt, hävdar vi att flera partiska splitter leder till mer realistiska prestandateskattningar än flera slumpmässiga splitter.', 'ta': '(CITATION) NLP சோதனைகளில் இயல்பான பிரிவுகளை விட நிலையான பிரிவுகளை பயன்படுத்துவதற்கு வாதம் தர்க்கம். We argue that random splits, like standard splits, lead to overly optimistic performance estimates.  நாம் பிரித்து தரவை பிரிக்கலாம் அல்லது எதிர்மறையான வழிகளில் பிரிக்கலாம், உதாரணமாக சிறிய வாக்கியங்களில் பயிற்சி  பைஸ்ட் மாதிரி தொகுப்பு டொமைன் ஒதுக்கீட்டில் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டது உண்மையான உலக செயல்பாட்டை பாவனைப்படு இது ஒரு மாற்று மாற்றம் கருத்து என்று தெரியும். ஆனால் NLP-ல் கூட மோசமான பெரிய பிரிவு, பியாஸ்களை அதிகப்படுத்துகிறது, பிழை காணப்படும் புதிய மாதிரிகளில் பார்க்கப்பட்ட பிழை, அதாவது, சோதனை நேரத்தில் மாதி இது மாறிய மாற்று எண்ணிக்கையை செலுத்தும். பல குறிப்பில்லாத பிரிவுகளை பயன்படுத்துவதற்கு பதிலாக எதிர்கால பென்மேக்குகள் பல, சுதந்திர சோதனையான அமைப்புகள குறிப்பில்லாத பல பிரிவுகளை விட அதிக உண்மையான செயல்பாட்டின் மதிப்புகளை காட்டுகிறது.', 'si': '(CITATION) ප්\u200dරමාණය NLP පරීක්ෂණාවට පරීක්ෂණයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙනුවෙන් ක්\u200dරමයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා කියලා, ස්ථානික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  අපිට පුළුවන් තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් නැත්නම් විරෝධ විදිහට පැහැදිලි කරන්න, උදාහරණයෙන්, කොටස් වචන නියම ලෝක විශ්වාස ක්\u200dරියාත්මක කරන්න සැම්ප්ලින් භාවිත කරලා තියෙනවා; මේක කොවාරියාට් වෙනස් හිතන්න කියලා දන්නවා. නමුත්, NLP වලින්, නරකම්, නරකම් වඩා නරකම් විදිහට පැහැදිලි වෙන්න, සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහට පරීක්ෂා වෙනුවෙන් අලුත් විදිහට පරීක්ෂා කරන්න පුළුවන්  මේක කොවාරියාට් වෙනස් විශ්වාස විශ්වාස කරනවා. ගොඩක් අවස්ථාවක් ස්ප්\u200dලිට් භාවිතා කරන්න, අනාගතයේ බෙන්ච්මාර්ක්ස් වලින් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැත්නම්, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා කියලා වැඩි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වඩා වැඩි වැඩි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක', 'ur': '(CITATION) NLP آزمائش میں استاندارڈ پلیٹوں کے بدلے ناقص پلیٹوں کا استعمال کرنے کے لئے جھگڑا کیا گیا۔ ہم جھگڑتے ہیں کہ ناقص تقسیم، استاندارڈ تقسیم کی طرح، بہت اچھی پرورش کا اندازہ پہنچاتے ہیں۔ ہم بھی ایسے طریقے سے ڈاٹے ٹکڑے ٹکڑے کر سکتے ہیں یا مخالف طریقے سے، جیسے چھوٹے جماعتوں کی تعلیم اور طویل جماعتوں کی تعلیم کرسکتے ہیں۔ بہت زیادہ نمونہ ڈومین اڈیٹ میں استعمال کیا گیا ہے کہ حقیقی دنیاوی ڈریفرٹ سیمولیٹ کرے۔ یہ معلوم ہوتا ہے کہ کاوفاریت تغییر فرض ہے لیکن NLP میں بھی بدترین قسم پھٹ پھٹ پھٹ پھٹ پھٹ پھٹ پھٹ پھرتی ہے، بہت سے زیادہ اندازے سے کم پھٹ پھٹ پھٹ پھٹ پھیر رہی ہے، یعنی ڈومین ڈاٹ کے نو نمونڈے پر نظر کیا گیا ہے، یعنی ڈ یہ محبوب تغییر فرض کو غلط کرتا ہے۔ بہت سی تصادفی تقسیم استعمال کرنے کے بدلے، مستقبل بنچمارک باوجود بہت سی، مستقبل تست سٹ میں شامل کرنا چاہیے، اگر غیر قابل ہے تو ہم جھگڑتے ہیں کہ تعداد غیر قابل غیر قابل غیر قابل تعداد سے زیادہ حقیقی قابل تعداد کی تقدیر کی وجہ سے ہے.', 'vi': '(Citation) for using Ngẫu nhiên Split rather than tiêu chuẩn Splits in genLanguage Chúng tôi cho rằng những mảnh ngẫu nhiên, như những mảnh ghép tiêu chuẩn, dẫn đến những ước tính khả năng quá lạc quan. Chúng ta cũng có thể chia dữ liệu theo cách thiên lệch hoặc ngược nhau, ví dụ, đào tạo ngắn hạn phạt và đánh giá dài hạn. Phân tích bằng màu mè được dùng để mô phỏng sự trôi dạt thế giới thực. cái này được gọi là sự gia tăng ca kỳ. Trong giao dịch Nchọc, tuy nhiên, thậm chí trường hợp tệ nhất đã bị nứt, khả năng đoán sai, thường bị đánh giá thấp lỗi được phát hiện trên các mẫu mới của dữ liệu nội bộ, tức là dữ liệu mà các mô- đun nên thông thường tiến tới vào thời đi ểm thử nghiệm. Điều này làm vô hiệu hóa tình trạng chuyển đổi. Thay vì dùng các khớp ngẫu nhiên, các tiêu chuẩn tương lai nên có nhiều bộ thử độc lập, thay vào đó. nếu không khả thi, chúng tôi cho rằng nhiều chia tách có khuynh hướng dẫn đến khả năng thực tế hơn nhiều chia tách ngẫu nhiên.', 'uz': "(CITATION) NLP تاقیiyatlaridan andoza splitt boʻlishdan foydalanish uchun argument. Biz murakkab qilamiz, oddiy ajratish, standard ajratish kabi, ko'proq bajarish natijasini ko'proq ko'paytirish mumkin. Шунингдек, биз ҳам маълумотларни ўзгартириш ёки турли усулларга ажратишимиз мумкин, масалан, камбағал сўзлар ўртасида тайёргарлик ва жумладан узун қизматчиликни тафаккур қиламиз. Name bu o'zgarishni o'zgartirish deb nomlanadi. @ info: whatsthis This invalidates the covariate shift assumption.  Koʻproq tarqatish splitterini ishlatishdan oʻrniga kelajakdagi benchmarklar bir nechta, oʻrniga qoʻllanilmaydi. Agar yo'q bo'lsa, biz bir necha ko'pchilik qismlarini ko'p tarqaloqni ko'plab ajratishga ega bo'ladi.", 'bg': '(CITATION) твърди, че при експериментите с НЛП се използват случайни разделения вместо стандартни разделения. Ние твърдим, че случайни разделения, подобно на стандартните разделения, водят до прекалено оптимистични оценки на ефективността. Можем също така да разделяме данните по предубедени или противоречиви начини, например обучение по кратки изречения и оценка на дълги изречения. При адаптирането на домейна е използвано предубедено вземане на проби за симулиране на дрейф в реалния свят; Това е известно като предположението за ковариатно изместване. В НЛП обаче, дори и в най-лошия случай разделянето, максимално отклонение, често подценява грешката, наблюдавана при нови извадки от вътрешни данни, т.е. данните, към които моделите трябва да се обобщават минимално по време на теста. Това анулира предположението за ковариатно изместване. Вместо да се използват множество случайни разделения, бъдещите показатели следва в идеалния случай да включват множество независими тестови набори; ако е невъзможно, ние твърдим, че множеството предубедени разделения водят до по-реалистични оценки на ефективността, отколкото множеството произволни разделения.', 'nl': '(CITATION) pleitte voor het gebruik van random splits in plaats van standaard splits in NLP experimenten. We stellen dat willekeurige splits, zoals standaard splits, leiden tot te optimistische prestatieschattingen. We kunnen gegevens ook splitsen op een bevooroordeelde of tegenstrijdige manier, bijvoorbeeld trainen op korte zinnen en evalueren op lange zinnen. Biased sampling is gebruikt bij domeinaanpassing om de werkelijke drift te simuleren; Dit is bekend als de covariate shift veronderstelling. In NLP echter onderschatten zelfs worst-case splits, waarbij bias wordt gemaximaliseerd, vaak de fout die wordt waargenomen op nieuwe monsters van in-domain data, d.w.z. de gegevens die modellen minimaal moeten generaliseren op testtijd. Dit maakt de aanname van covariate verschuiving ongeldig. In plaats van meerdere willekeurige splits te gebruiken, moeten toekomstige benchmarks idealiter meerdere, onafhankelijke testsets omvatten; indien niet haalbaar, stellen we dat meerdere biased splits leiden tot realistischere prestatieschattingen dan meerdere willekeurige splits.', 'da': '(CITATION) argumenterede for at bruge tilfældige split snarere end standard split i NLP-eksperimenter. Vi hævder, at tilfældige split, ligesom standard split, fører til alt for optimistiske præstationsestimater. Vi kan også opdele data på partiske eller modstridende måder, f.eks. træning i korte sætninger og evaluering af lange. Biased prøveudtagning er blevet anvendt i domænetilpasning til at simulere den virkelige verdens drift Dette er kendt som kovariat skift antagelse. I NLP undervurderer selv de værste tilfælde opdelinger, der maksimerer bias, ofte fejlen observeret på nye prøver af in-domæne data, dvs. de data, som modeller minimum bør generalisere til på testtidspunktet. Dette ugyldiggør antagelsen om kovariat skift. I stedet for at anvende flere tilfældige opdelinger bør fremtidige benchmarks ideelt set omfatte flere uafhængige testsæt i stedet. Hvis det ikke er muligt, hævder vi, at flere partiske splitter fører til mere realistiske præstationsestimater end flere tilfældige splitter.', 'hr': '(CITATION) tvrdi za korištenje slučajnih dijelova umjesto standardnih dijelova u eksperimentima NLP. Tvrdimo da nasumični dijelovi, poput standardnih dijelova, dovede do pretjerano optimistične procjene učinka. Možemo podijeliti i podatke na predrasude ili neprijateljski način, npr. obuku na kratke rečenice i procjenu dugih rečenica. Primjena uzoraka je korišćena u adaptaciji domena za simulaciju stvarnog svijeta; ovo je poznato kao pretpostavka kovariata smjene. Međutim, u NLP-u čak i najgorim slučajevima, maksimalizirajući pristrasnost, često podcjenjuju pogrešku koja je promatrana na novim uzorcima podataka u domenu, tj. podataka koje bi modeli trebali minimalno generalizirati na vrijeme testa. Ovo invalidira pretpostavku kovarijatne smjene. Umjesto korištenja višestrukih slučajnih dijelova, buduće kriterije moraju idealno uključiti višestruke, nezavisne testove umjesto toga; ako je neprijatno, tvrdimo da višestruki predrasudeni dijelovi vodi do realističnih procjena učinkovitosti nego višestruke nasumične dijelove.', 'id': '(CITATION) berdebat untuk menggunakan splits acak daripada splits standar dalam eksperimen NLP. Kami berdebat bahwa pembagian acak, seperti pembagian standar, menyebabkan perhitungan prestasi yang terlalu optimistis. Kita juga dapat membagi data dengan cara bias atau bertentangan, misalnya, latihan pada kalimat pendek dan mengevaluasi pada kalimat panjang. Sampel biased telah digunakan dalam adaptasi domain untuk simulasi drift dunia nyata; ini dikenal sebagai asumsi perubahan kovariat. In NLP, however, even worst-case splits, maximizing bias, often under-estimate the error observed on new samples of in-domain data, i.e., the data that models should minimally generalize to at test time.  Ini invalidasi asumsi shift kovarian. Daripada menggunakan berbagai pembagian acak, benchmarks masa depan ideal harus termasuk berbagai set tes independen sebagai gantinya; jika tidak dapat disembunyikan, kita berdebat bahwa pembagian berbilang biased menyebabkan perhitungan prestasi yang lebih realistis daripada pembagian berbilang acak.', 'ko': '(인용문) NLP 실험에서 표준 버스트 대신 무작위 버스트를 사용해야 한다고 주장했다.우리는 표준 분해와 마찬가지로 무작위 분해는 지나치게 낙관적인 성능 평가를 초래할 수 있다고 생각한다.우리는 짧은 문장 훈련과 긴 문장 평가 등 편견이나 적대적인 방식으로 데이터를 분할할 수도 있다.샘플링은 실제 세계의 표류를 모의하기 위해 지역 적응에 사용된다.이것이 바로 이른바 협동 변수 전이 가설이다.그러나 NLP에서 최악의 상황에서도 분할은 편차를 극대화하고 역내 데이터의 새로운 샘플에서 관찰한 오차, 즉 모델이 테스트할 때 최소한으로 보급해야 하는 데이터를 과소평가한다.이것은 협동 변수 전이 가설을 실효시켰다.미래의 기준 테스트는 여러 개의 독립된 테스트 집합을 포함하는 것이 좋고 여러 개의 무작위 분할을 사용하는 것이 아니다.만약 실행할 수 없다면, 우리는 여러 개의 편차가 있는 분할이 여러 개의 무작위 분할보다 더욱 현실적인 성능 평가를 초래할 것이라고 생각한다.', 'fa': '(CITATION) برای استفاده از قطعه\u200cهای تصادفی به جای قطعه\u200cهای استاندارد در آزمایشات NLP اختلاف کرد. ما بحث می\u200cکنیم که تقسیم تصادفی، مثل تقسیم استاندارد، به تقسیم عملکرد خیلی optimistic می\u200cرسد. ما می توانیم اطلاعات را به طریق مخالفت یا مخالفت تقسیم کنیم، مثلاً آموزش روی جمله\u200cهای کوتاه و ارزیابی روی جمله\u200cهای طولانی. نمونه\u200cهای زیادی در تغییرات دامنی برای شبیه سازی دریافت دنیای واقعی استفاده شده است. این به عنوان فرضیه تغییر کوکاری شناخته شده است. ولی در NLP، حتی بدترین حالت تقسیم می\u200cکند، بزرگترین تقسیم\u200cها، اغلب خطای را در نمونه\u200cهای جدید داده\u200cهای دامنی، یعنی داده\u200cهایی که مدلها باید کمترین عمومی به زمان آزمایش تبدیل کنند. این فرضیه تغییر تغییر کوکاریا را ناتوان می کند. به جای استفاده از قطعه\u200cهای تعدادی تصادفی، برچسب\u200cهای آینده باید در عوض مجموعه\u200cهای آزمایش\u200cهای تعدادی، مستقل شامل باشند. اگر غیر قابل تفاوتی باشد، ما بحث می کنیم که تقسیم چندین تقسیم متفاوتی به تقسیم فعالیت واقعی بیشتری از تقسیم چندین تصادفی می کند.', 'de': '(CITATION) argumentierte für die Verwendung von Zufallsspaltungen anstelle von Standardspaltungen in NLP-Experimenten. Wir argumentieren, dass zufällige Aufteilungen, wie Standard-Aufteilungen, zu zu optimistischen Leistungsschätzungen führen. Wir können Daten auch auf voreingenommene oder widersprüchliche Weise aufteilen, z.B. Training auf kurzen Sätzen und Auswertung auf langen Sätzen. Biased Sampling wurde bei der Domänenanpassung zur Simulation der realen Drift verwendet; Dies ist bekannt als die Kovariate Shift Annahme. In NLP jedoch unterschätzen selbst die Worst-Case-Splits, die den Bias maximieren, oft den Fehler, der bei neuen Stichproben von In-Domain-Daten beobachtet wird, d.h. die Daten, auf die Modelle zum Testzeitpunkt minimal verallgemeinern sollten. Dies macht die Annahme der Kovariaten-Verschiebung ungültig. Anstatt mehrere zufällige Aufteilungen zu verwenden, sollten zukünftige Benchmarks idealerweise mehrere, unabhängige Testsätze umfassen; Wenn dies unmöglich ist, argumentieren wir, dass mehrere verzerrte Splits zu realistischeren Leistungsschätzungen führen als mehrere zufällige Splits.', 'tr': "NLP deneylerinde standart parçalary ýerine, hassas parçalary ulanmak üçin argyl etdi. Biraz tesadüf bölümi, standart bölümleri ýaly, aşırı optimistik ukyplary çaklaýar. Biz hem maglumatlary biatdan ýa-da rakip ýoly bilen bölüşdürip bileris, myselýe gysga sözler bilen okamak we uzak sözler bilen deňleşip bileris. Gerçek dünýä drift simulasy üçin biraz örän nusgasy ulanyldy. bu ýer kowariýa çalyşyk hökmünde tanalýar. Ancak NLP'de, hatta en kötü şekilde bölünmek, terbiyesini azaltmak, köplenç domenin verilerinde yeni örnekleri üzerinde gözlenen hatayı tahmin edip bilmez, yani modellerin test e zamanında en azından generalizasynda edilmeli veriler. Bu sahypalar boýunça çalyşmasyny ýalňyşýar. Birnäçe tesadüf parçalary ulanmakyň ýerine, gelejek benchmarklaryň ýerine bir näçe, täze testiň düzümleri bolmaly; Eger hiç ýaramaz bolsa, birnäçe üýtgeşik böleginiň birnäçe üýtgeşik böleginiň birnäçe waýtgeşik böleginden köp realistik hasaplamagyna sebep edendigini aýtdyk.", 'sw': '(CITATION) alihoji kwa kutumia utofauti wa urahisi kuliko kupasuka kwa kiwango cha kawaida katika majaribio ya NLP. Tunahusiana na kwamba upande wa urahisi, kama upande wa kiwango cha kawaida, unasababisha kiasi kikubwa cha utendaji wa matumaini. Tunaweza pia kugawanya taarifa kwa njia za upendeleo au tofauti, kwa mfano mafunzo ya hukumu fupi na kutathmini kwa muda mrefu. Mfano uliopigwa umetumiwa katika mazingira ya ndani ili kuunganisha utaratibu halisi wa dunia; hii inajulikana kama dhana ya mabadiliko ya tofauti. NLP, hata hivyo, hata hivyo, inapambana na kesi mbaya zaidi, kwa kiasi kikubwa zaidi, mara nyingi chini ya kutathmini kosa lililoonekana kwenye sampuli mpya ya data za ndani, yaani, taarifa ambazo mifano inapaswa kuzalisha kwa kiasi kidogo mpaka wakati wa jaribio. This invalidates the covariate shift assumption.  Badala ya kutumia sehemu mbalimbali za urahisi, bendera za baadaye zinapaswa kuwajumuisha matokeo mengi, majaribio huru badala yake; kama hawana uwezekano, tunahoji kuwa sehemu mbalimbali za upinzani zinasababisha utendaji wa ukweli zaidi ya sehemu mbalimbali.', 'af': '(Staatsie) argumenteer vir gebruik van willekeurige splitte eerder as standaard splitte in NLP eksperimente. Ons argumenteer dat willekeurige splittings, soos standaard splittings, lei na oorsaaklik optimistiese prestasies. Ons kan ook data in biased of teenwoordige maniere skei, bv. onderwerp op kort setinge en evalueer op lange een. Gebruik versameling is gebruik in domein aanpassing om reël- wêreld drift te simuleer; Dit is bekend as die konaarietskappel aanvaardig. In NLP, egter, selfs die worst- case splits, maksimalisering bias, dikwels onder- estimaties die fout aangesien op nuwe voorbeelde van in- domein data, i. e. die data wat model moet minimaal genereer na toets tyd. Hierdie verkeerd die konaariete verskuif aanvaar. In plaas van gebruik van veelvuldige willekeurige splitte, toekomstige benchmarke moet ideaal veelvuldige, onveilige toets stel in plaas insluit; en indien onbeskikbaar, ons argumenteer dat veelvuldige biased splittings lei na meer realistiese prestasie as veelvuldige willekeurige splittings.', 'sq': '(CITATION) argumentoi për përdorimin e ndarjeve të rastësishme në vend të ndarjeve standarde në eksperimentet NLP. Ne argumentojmë se ndarjet e rastësishme, si ndarjet standarde, çojnë në vlerësime tepër optimiste të performancës. Ne mund të ndajmë gjithashtu të dhënat në mënyra të paragjykuara apo kundërshtare, për shembull, trainimin mbi dënimet e shkurtra dhe vlerësimin mbi ato të gjata. Biased sampling has been used in domain adaptation to simulate real-world drift;  kjo është e njohur si supozimi i ndryshimit kovarian. Në NLP, megjithatë, edhe rastet më të këqija ndahen, duke maksimizuar paragjykimet, shpesh nënvlerësojnë gabimin e vëzhguar në mostrat e reja të të dhënave në domeni, pra, të dhënat që modelet duhet minimalisht të gjeneralizohen në kohën e testit. Kjo invalidon supozimin e ndryshimit kovarian. Në vend të përdorimit të ndarjeve të shumta të rastësishme, parametrat e ardhshme duhet idealisht të përfshijnë në vend të kësaj grupe të shumta testimi të pavarur; në qoftë se është e papërshtatshme, argumentojmë se ndarjet e shumta të paragjykuara çojnë në vlerësime më realiste të performancës sesa ndarjet e shumta të rastësishme.', 'am': '(CITATION) argued for using random splits rather than standard splits in NLP experiments.  እንደተጨማሪው ክፍል ምናልባት የሽፋን ስርዓት ይሻላል፡፡ ዳራዎችን በተቃዋሚ ወይም በተቃዋሚ መንገድ እንለያይ ዘንድ እንችላለን፣ ለምሳሌ የጥቂት ቃላት ማህበረሰብ እና ረጅም ዘመናት ማረጋገጫ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የተለየ ምሳሌ በዶሜን አካባቢ ላይ የተጠቀመ ነው፤ እውነተኛውን ዓለም አቀማመጥ ለመስተካከል ነው፡፡ ይሄ የተለየ መፍጠር ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን በNLP፣ የክፋት ክፍል፣ የውይይት ክፍል፣ ብዙ ጊዜም በአዲስ ዶሜን ዳታ ላይ የተደረገውን ስህተት ያሳስፋል፡፡ ይህ የተለየ የፊደል ቅርጽ እውቀት ያስተካክላል። undo-type ደካማ ቢሆን፣ ብዙ ተቃውሞ የደረሰበት የውጤት ስርዓት ከሁለት እጥፍ ይልቅ የበለጠ ነው ብለን እንከራከራለን፡፡', 'hy': '(ԿԻՏԱԿՆ) պնդեց, որ օգտագործում է պատահական բաժանմունքներ, ոչ թե ստանդարտ բաժանմունքներ ՆԼՊ փորձերում: Մենք փաստարկում ենք, որ պատահական բաժանմունքները, ինչպես ստանդարտ բաժանմունքները, հանգեցնում են չափազանց լավատես արդյունավետության գնահատման: Մենք նաև կարող ենք բաժանել տվյալները կողմնակի կամ հակառակ ձևերով, օրինակ՝ վարժեցնել կարճ նախադասությունների և գնահատել երկար նախադասությունները: Սկզբնական նմուշները օգտագործվել են բնագավառի ադապտացիայի մեջ իրական աշխարհի շարժման նմուշման համար: սա հայտնի է որպես կովարիատ փոփոխության ենթադրություն: Այնուամենայնիվ, ՆԼՊ-ում նույնիսկ ամենավատ դեպքերում բաժանում են, մեծանալով կողմնականությունը, հաճախ թերագնահատում են այն սխալը, որը հայտնաբերվել է նոր տիեզերական տվյալների նմուշների վրա, այսինքն այն տվյալները, որոնց մոդելները պետք է միմինալիմա Սա անհամապատասխանում է կովարային փոփոխության ենթադրությունը: Instead of using multiple random splits, future benchmarks should ideally include multiple, independent test sets instead;  եթե անհասանելի, մենք փաստարկում ենք, որ բազմաթիվ կողմնակի բաժանմունքները հանգեցնում են ավելի իրական արդյունավետության գնահատականներ, քան բազմաթիվ պատահական բաժանմունքներ:', 'bn': '(সিটারিশন) এনএলপি পরীক্ষার পরিকল্পনার পরিবর্তে স্বাভাবিক ভাগের ব্যবহারের জন্য যুক্তি প্রদান করেছে। আমরা যুক্তি দিচ্ছি যে অদ্ভুত বিভক্ত, যেমন স্ট্যান্ডার্ড বিভক্ত, তার ফলে আশাবাদী প্রদর্শনের হিসাব বেশী হ আমরা তথ্য বিভিন্ন বা বিরোধী উপায়ে ভাগ করতে পারি, যেমন সংক্ষিপ্ত বাক্যের প্রশিক্ষণ এবং দীর্ঘদিনের মূল্যায়ন করা। পৃথিবীর বিশ্বকাপের সিমুলেট করার জন্য ডোমেইন অ্যাডাপ্টেশনে বাইজ ডাম্পলিং ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে; এটা কোভারেট পরিবর্তন হিসেবে পরিচিত। তবে এনএলপিতে এমনকি সবচেয়ে খারাপ বিভাগ, বিভিন্ন বিভাগ, প্রায়শই ডোমেইন ডাটার নতুন নমুনামে দেখা যায় ত্রুটি নির্ধারণ করা হয়, যেমন ডেটার যে তথ্য পরীক্ষা এটি কোভারেট পরিবর্তনের ধারণা অকার্যকর। বেশ কয়েকটি অদ্ভুত পরিস্থিতি ব্যবহার করার পরিবর্তে ভবিষ্যতের বেনম্যার্কের মধ্যে বেশ কিছু স্বাধীন পরীক্ষা সে if infeasible, we argue that multiple biased splits leads to more realistic performance estimates than multiple random splits.', 'ca': "(CITATION) argued for using random splits rather than standard splits in NLP experiments.  Afirmem que les divisions aleatòries, com les divisions estàndard, porten a estimacions de rendiment excessivament optimistes. També podem dividir les dades de maneres imparcials o adversaries, per exemple, entrenar en frases curtes i evaluar en frases llargues. S'ha utilitzat una mostra biased en l'adaptació de dominis per simular el flux del món real; és conegut com la suposició de canvi covariat. En NLP, no obstant això, fins i tot els pitjors casos es divideixen, maximitzant el bias, sovint subestimant l'error observat en les noves mostres de dades en domini, és a dir, les dades a les que els models haurien de generalitzar mínimament en el moment de la prova. Això invalida la suposició de canvi covariat. En comptes d'utilitzar múltiples divisions aleatòries, els punts de referència futurs haurien d'incloure, idealment, múltiples conjunts de proves independents; si infeasible, argumentem que múltiples divisions biasades porten a estimacions de rendiment més realistes que múltiples divisions aleatòries.", 'az': 'NLP eksperimentlərində standart parçalarının yerinə rastgele parçaları istifadə etmək üçün mübahisə edildi. Biz bu rastgele parçalar, standart parçaları kimi, çox optimistik performans təcrübələrinə yol göstərir. Biz də məlumatları tərəfindən və düşmənçilik yollarına bölüşdürə bilərik, məsələn, qısa sözlər təhsil edir və uzun sözlər təhsil edirik. Həqiqət dünya drift simülasyonu etmək üçün çox böyük nümunələr sahəsində istifadə edildi; bu, covariat dəyişiklik iddiası kimi bilinir. Ancaq NLP-də ən pis hissələr parçalanır, tərzlərini böyükləyir, çox dəyişiklik dəyişiklik məlumatlarının yeni nümunələrində görünən xətaları, məsələn modellərin sınama vaxtında ən azından generalizlənməsi lazımdır. Bu, covariat dəyişiklik varlığını boşaltır. Birçoxlu rastgele bölümləri istifadə etmək yerinə, gələcək bölümlər ideal olaraq çoxlu, bağımsız test qurularını daxil etməlidir; Əgər dəyişiklik deyilsə, biz mübahisə edirik ki, çoxlu təsirli bölümlər çoxlu təsirli bölümlərdən daha çox realistik performanslıq hesablarına yol verər.', 'bs': '(CITATION) tvrdi za korištenje nasumičnih dijelova umjesto standardnih dijelova u eksperimentima NLP. Svađamo se da nasumični dijelovi, poput standardnih dijelova, dovede do pretjerano optimistične procjene učinka. Možemo podijeliti i podatke na predrasude ili neprijateljski način, npr. obuku na kratke rečenice i procjenu dugih rečenica. Koristilo se uzorke u adaptaciji domena za simulaciju stvarnog svijeta; ovo je poznato kao pretpostavka kovarijske smjene. Međutim, u NLP-u čak i najgorim slučajevima, maksimalizirajući pristrasnost, često podcjenjuju pogrešku koja je posmatrana na novim uzorcima podataka u domenu, tj. podataka koje bi modeli trebali minimalno generalizirati na vrijeme testa. Ovo invalidira pretpostavku kovarijatne smjene. Umjesto da koriste višestruke nasumične dijelove, buduće kriterije moraju idealno uključiti višestruke, nezavisne testove umjesto toga; Ako je nevoljno, tvrdimo da višestruki predrasudeni dijelovi vodi do reālističkih procjena učinkovitosti nego višestruke nasumične dijelove.', 'fi': '(CITATION) väitti, että NLP-kokeissa käytetään satunnaisjakoja vakiojakojen sijaan. Väitämme, että satunnaiset jaot, kuten standardijaot, johtavat liian optimistisiin suoritusarvioihin. Voimme jakaa dataa myös puolueellisesti tai vastakkaisesti, esimerkiksi lyhyiden lauseiden harjoittelussa ja pitkien lauseiden arvioinnissa. Monipuolista näytteenottoa on käytetty reaalimaailman ajautumisen simulointiin. Tätä kutsutaan kovariaattisiirtymäoletuksena. NLP:ssä kuitenkin huonoimmassakin tapauksessa jakaumat, maksimoivat viés, aliarvioivat usein uusien domain-aineistonäytteiden virhettä eli tietoja, joihin mallien tulisi vähintäänkin yleistää testiaikana. Tämä mitätöi kovariaattisiirtymäoletuksen. Usean satunnaisjaon sijaan tuleviin vertailuarvoihin olisi ihanteellisesti sisällyttävä useita riippumattomia testisarjoja. Jos se on mahdoton toteuttaa, väitämme, että useat puolueelliset jaot johtavat realistisempiin suoritusarvioihin kuin useat satunnaisjaot.', 'et': '(CITATION) väitis, et uue tööprogrammi katsetes kasutatakse pigem juhuslikke jaotusi kui standardseid jaotusi. Me väidame, et juhuslikud jagunemised, nagu tavalised jagunemised, viivad liiga optimistlike tulemuslikkuse hinnanguteni. Samuti saame andmeid jagada erapooletult või vastastikuselt, näiteks lühikeste lausete koolitamisel ja pikkade lausete hindamisel. Valdkonna kohandamisel on kasutatud kalduvproove reaalmaailma triivi simuleerimiseks; Seda tuntakse kui kaasmuutuja nihke eeldust. NLP-is aga isegi halvimate juhtude jaotused, maksimeerivad kallakud, sageli alahindavad uutel domeenisiseste andmete valimitel täheldatud viga, st andmeid, millele mudelid peaksid testimise ajal minimaalselt üldistama. See tühistab kaasmuutuja nihke eelduse. Mitme juhusliku jaotuse asemel peaksid tulevased võrdlusnäitajad ideaalselt hõlmama mitut sõltumatut katsekogumit; Kui see ei ole teostatav, siis väidame, et mitu erapooletut jaotust viivad realistlikumate tulemuslikkuse hinnanguteni kui mitu juhuslikku jaotust.', 'cs': '(CITATION) argumentoval pro použití náhodných rozdělení spíše než standardních rozdělení v NLP experimentech. Tvrdíme, že náhodné rozdělení, stejně jako standardní rozdělení, vede k příliš optimistickým odhadům výkonnosti. Můžeme také rozdělit data zaujatými nebo nepřátelskými způsoby, např. tréninkem krátkých vět a hodnocením dlouhých. Při adaptaci domén pro simulaci driftu v reálném světě bylo použito zkreslené vzorkování; Toto je známé jako předpoklad kovariatního posunu. V NLP však i rozdělení v nejhorším případě, maximalizující bias, často podceňují chybu pozorovanou na nových vzorcích dat v doméně, tedy data, na která by modely měly během testu minimálně zobecnit. To zrušuje předpoklad kovariatního posunu. Namísto používání více náhodných rozdělení by budoucí referenční hodnoty měly ideálně zahrnovat více nezávislých testovacích sad; Pokud je to nemožné, argumentujeme, že více zaujatých rozdělení vede k realističtějším odhadům výkonnosti než více náhodných rozdělení.', 'jv': '(CITITIon) Ngabah bener gampang karo Split Samsul Rasane Awak dhéwé iso nggambar dadi biasane, iso nggambar obang-obang, isih. njuk, nglanggar-obang langgar sapa mbutuhak lan ijol-ujaran langgar. Biasad sampling has been used in domain modification to Simate true-world drivef;  layers-action NoneInclude threshold Learn Mode Taning politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'sk': '(CITATION) je zagovarjal uporabo naključnih delitev namesto standardnih delitev v poskusih NLP. Trdimo, da naključne delitve, kot so standardne delitve, vodijo do preveč optimističnih ocen uspešnosti. Podatke lahko razdelimo tudi pristransko ali nasprotno, npr. usposabljanje o kratkih stavkih in ocenjevanje na dolgih stavkih. Pri prilagajanju področja je bilo uporabljeno pristransko vzorčenje za simuliranje premika v realnem svetu; To je znano kot predpostavka kovariatnega premika. V NLP pa tudi razdelitve v najslabšem primeru, kar povečuje pristranskost, pogosto podcenjujejo napako, opaženo na novih vzorcih podatkov v domeni, tj. podatke, na katere bi morali modeli v času preskusa minimalno posplošiti. To razveljavi predpostavko kovariatnega premika. Namesto uporabe večkratnih naključnih razdelitev bi morala prihodnja referenčna merila v idealnem primeru vključevati več neodvisnih preskusnih sklopov; Če je neizvedljivo, trdimo, da več pristranskih delitev vodi do realističnejših ocen uspešnosti kot več naključnih delitev.', 'ha': "(CITATI) ya yi jãyayya a yi amfani da rabo da ba da daidai ko da jarrabar tsãge na NLP. We argue that random splits, like standard splits, lead to overly optimistic performance estimates.  Kana iya iya raba data cikin shirin da aka sãɓa ko masu motsi, misali, wa'adin maganar ƙarƙashin da ke ƙayyade masu yiwuwa. An yi amfani da misalin da aka yi saka cikin adadin ɗin ayuka, don ya yi daidai wa durowa-duniya masu gaske; Yana sanin zaɓen wata dabar-dabar. Amma, kuma amma, cikin NLP, tsãge mafi sharri, zai faɗaɗa ɓarna, ko da yawa a ƙayyade ɓarna da aka gano a kan misãlai na cikin-danne guda, misali, data da kwamfyuta misalin kwamfyuta ya ƙayyade shi zuwa a lokacin jarraba. Wannan yana gyare zaɓen musanyi mai kwamfyuta. Yi amfani da misãlan rabo masu buƙata, bangon matsayin bayani ya kamata su haɗa matsayi masu yawa, da masu buɗaɗe; Idan ba'a yi rauni ba, sai mu yi jãyayya kuwa rabon sauri masu yawa yana iya ƙidãya ga aikin da ke sauri ko da sauri guda.", 'bo': '(CITATION) argued for using random splits rather than standard splits in NLP experiments. ང་ཚོས་རྣམས་ཀྱིས་གནད་མེད་སྡུད་ཚན་མི་དཔེར་ན། སྔོན་གྱི་བསྡུར་ཚན་ལྟ་བུ་འདིས་མཐུན་པར་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གནད་མིན་འགྱུར་བ་དང་། དཔེར་ན། ཚིག་ཚིག་ཐག་ཐུང་པ་དང་། རིང་ཐག་ཐུང་འཕྲད་ཀྱི་སློབ་ སྤྱིར་བཏང་ཡོད་པའི་དཔེ་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིག་དག་གི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ནང་སྤྱོད་ཚར་བ འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྩ་འཁོར་གྱི་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་ཐབས་ཤིག་དང་། However, in NLP, even worst-case splits, maximizing bias, often under-estimate the error observed on new samples of in-domain data, i.e. the data that models should minimally generalize to at test time. In NLP, this is the data that models should minimize to test time. འདིས་དགོས་མཁན་གྱི་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་རྒྱུན་བཅོས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འདི་ལས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་མང་པོ་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱོད་མི་ཐུབ གལ་སྲིད།', 'he': '(ציטציה) טוען על השימוש בחלקות אקראיות במקום בחלקות סטנדרטיות בניסויים NLP. אנו מתווכחים כי חלקים אקראיים, כמו חלקים סטנדרטיים, מובילים להערכות ביצועים אופטימיות מדי. אנחנו יכולים גם לחלק נתונים בדרכים משותפות או נוגדיות, למשל אימונים על משפטים קצרים ובעריכה על משפטים ארוכים. Biased sampling has been used in domain adaptation to simulate real-world drift;  this is known as the covariate shift assumption.  In NLP, however, even worst-case splits, maximizing bias, often under-estimate the error observed on new samples of in-domain data, i.e., the data that models should minimally generalize to at test time.  זה מבטל את ההנחה על המשמרת הקובריאטית. Instead of using multiple random splits, future benchmarks should ideally include multiple, independent test sets instead;  if infeasible, we argue that multiple biased splits leads to more realistic performance estimates than multiple random splits.'}
{'en': 'Alignment verification to improve NMT translation towards highly inflectional languages with limited resources', 'es': 'Verificación de alineación para mejorar la traducción de NMT hacia idiomas altamente flexibles con recursos limitados', 'ar': 'التحقق من المحاذاة لتحسين ترجمة NMT نحو لغات تصريفية للغاية بموارد محدودة', 'fr': "Vérification de l'alignement pour améliorer la traduction NMT vers des langues fortement flexionnelles avec des ressources limitées", 'pt': 'Verificação de alinhamento para melhorar a tradução NMT para idiomas altamente flexionais com recursos limitados', 'ja': '限られたリソースで高度に曲がりくねった言語に向かってNMT翻訳を改善するためのアライメント検証', 'zh': '齐验之,以改进 NMT 译,使其资源有限转为高屈之语', 'hi': 'सीमित संसाधनों के साथ अत्यधिक inflectional भाषाओं की ओर NMT अनुवाद में सुधार करने के लिए संरेखण सत्यापन', 'ru': 'Проверка выравнивания для улучшения перевода НМТ в сторону сильно изогнутых языков с ограниченными ресурсами', 'ga': 'Fíorú ailínithe chun feabhas a chur ar aistriúchán NMT i dtreo teangacha an-infhillteacha le hacmhainní teoranta', 'hu': 'Az NMT fordításának javítása a korlátozott erőforrásokkal rendelkező, erősen rugalmas nyelvekre történő igazítás ellenőrzése érdekében', 'el': 'Επαλήθευση ευθυγράμμισης για τη βελτίωση της μετάφρασης σε γλώσσες υψηλής κλίσης με περιορισμένους πόρους', 'it': "Verifica dell'allineamento per migliorare la traduzione NMT verso lingue altamente inflessionali con risorse limitate", 'ka': 'NMT გადაწყვეტილების განსხვავება ძალიან ინფლექციონალური ენებისთვის განსხვავება', 'mk': 'Верификација на прилагодување за подобрување на преводот на NMT кон јазици со ограничени ресурси', 'kk': 'NMT аудармасын шектелген ресурстар үшін көп инффекциялық тілдерге жақсарту үшін тексеру', 'ms': 'Pengesahan penyesuaian untuk meningkatkan terjemahan NMT ke dalam bahasa yang sangat mengalir dengan sumber terbatas', 'lt': 'Suderinimo tikrinimas, siekiant pagerinti NMT vertimą į labai nepalankias kalbas su ribotais ištekliais', 'no': 'Justeringsverifikasjon for å forbetra NMT-omsetjing mot høg infleksjonsspråk med begrensede ressursar', 'ml': 'നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്ന വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ഏറ്റവും സാധാരണമുള്ള ഭാഷകളിലേക്ക് NMT പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുവാന', 'pl': 'Weryfikacja dostosowania w celu poprawy tłumaczenia NMT na języki o wysokiej inflekcji z ograniczonymi zasobami', 'ro': 'Verificarea alinierii pentru a îmbunătăți traducerea NMT către limbi extrem de inflexionale, cu resurse limitate', 'mt': 'Alignment verification to improve NMT translation towards highly inflectional languages with limited resources', 'mn': 'NMT хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хэл дээр хязгаарлагдмал нөөц болон', 'sr': 'Verifikacija ispravljanja kako bi poboljšala prevod NMT prema visoko uticajnim jezicima sa ograničenim resursima', 'si': 'NMT පරිවර්තනය වැඩි කරන්න සඳහා සීමාවිත සම්බන්ධ භාෂාව සඳහා සීමාවිත භාෂාවට ප්\u200dරශ්නය ක', 'sv': 'Justeringsverifiering för att förbättra NMT-översättningen mot mycket böjliga språk med begränsade resurser', 'ur': 'NMT ترجمہ کو بہت زیادہ اثبات کی زبانوں کی طرف متصل کرنے کے لئے سفارش کرنا', 'so': 'Signiinta isbedelka si uu u beddelo tarjumaadda NMT xagga luuqadaha aad u saameysan oo ay ku haystaan resources xadgudban', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Sự kiểm tra liên lạc nhằm cải tiến dịch NMT tới những ngôn ngữ có xu hướng có giới hạn', 'bg': 'Проверка на подравняването за подобряване на превода на НМТ към силно гъвкави езици с ограничени ресурси', 'da': 'Justeringsverifikation for at forbedre oversættelse af NMT til meget fleksible sprog med begrænsede ressourcer', 'nl': 'Verificatie van afstemming om NMT-vertaling te verbeteren naar sterk inflectionele talen met beperkte middelen', 'hr': 'Provjera isprave za poboljšanje prevoda NMT-a na vrlo utjecajne jezike s ograničenim resursima', 'de': 'Alignment Verifikation zur Verbesserung der NMT-Übersetzung auf stark flexionsfähige Sprachen mit begrenzten Ressourcen', 'id': 'Verifikasi penyesuaian untuk meningkatkan terjemahan NMT menuju bahasa yang sangat infleksional dengan sumber daya terbatas', 'ko': '정렬 검증을 통해 리소스가 제한된 상황에서 NMT의 굴절 언어 번역 향상', 'fa': 'تأثیر تأثیر تأثیر برای تأثیر ترجمه NMT به زبانهای بسیار تحت تاثیر با منابع محدودیت', 'tr': 'NMT terjimesini bejermek üçin çykyş edilen çeşmeler üçin çykyş barlamak', 'af': 'Oplyn verifikasie om NMT vertaling te verbeter na hoë infleksionele tale met beperkte hulpbron', 'sw': 'Kuthibitishwa kwa ajili ya kuboresha tafsiri ya NMT kwa lugha zenye ushawishi mkubwa na rasilimali chache', 'sq': 'Verifikimi i përshtatjes për të përmirësuar përkthimin e NMT drejt gjuhëve shumë të pakufishme me burime të kufizuara', 'am': 'የNMT ትርጉም በተለየ ቋንቋዎች ላይ በተለየ ሀብት ይዞታሉ', 'hy': 'ՆՄԹ թարգմանությունը բարելավելու համար հարմարեցման ստուգում բարձր ազդեցություն ունեցող լեզուների վրա սահմանափակ ռեսուրսներով', 'az': 'NMT tercüməsini yüksək etkileşimli dillərə müəyyən etmək üçün tədriclənmə tədriclənməsi', 'bn': 'বেশী প্রভাবিত ভাষার প্রতি এনএমটি অনুবাদ উন্নত করার জন্য সীমাবদ্ধ সম্পদ', 'cs': 'Ověření sladění za účelem zlepšení překladu NMT směrem k vysoce flexionálním jazykům s omezenými zdroji', 'bs': 'Verifikacija isprave za poboljšanje prevoda NMT-a na visoko uticajne jezike sa ograničenim resursima', 'ca': "Verifica d'allinjament per millorar la traducció del MTN cap a llengües altament inflexionals amb recursos limitats", 'et': 'Ühtlustamise kontroll, et parandada NMT tõlget väga paindlikele keeltele piiratud ressurssidega', 'fi': 'Yhdenmukaisuuden todentaminen NMT:n kääntämisen parantamiseksi erittäin taipuvaisille kielille, joilla on rajalliset resurssit', 'jv': 'Ngubah punika-punika', 'sk': 'Preverjanje poravnave za izboljšanje prevajanja NMT v zelo infleksivne jezike z omejenimi viri', 'ha': '@ item: inmenu Text Completion', 'he': 'האמת התאמה כדי לשפר את התרגום NMT אל שפות גבוהות מאוד עם משאבים מוגבלים', 'bo': 'NMT ཡི་སྐྱེས་ཚིག་དང་ཚད་རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་ཡར་སྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་པར་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'The present article discusses how to improve translation quality when using limited training data to translate towards morphologically rich languages. The starting point is a neural MT system, used to train translation models, using solely publicly available parallel data. An initial analysis of the translation output has shown that quality is sub-optimal, due mainly to an insufficient amount of training data. To improve translation quality, a hybridized solution is proposed, using an ensemble of relatively simple NMT systems trained with different metrics, combined with an open source module, designed for a low-resource MT system. Experimental results of the proposed hybridized method with multiple independent test sets achieve improvements over (i) both the best individual NMT and (ii) the standard ensemble system provided in the Marian-NMT system. Improvements over Marian-NMT are in many cases statistically significant. Finally, a qualitative analysis of translation results indicates a greater robustness for the hybridized method.', 'ar': 'تناقش المقالة الحالية كيفية تحسين جودة الترجمة عند استخدام بيانات تدريب محدودة للترجمة إلى لغات غنية شكليًا. نقطة البداية هي نظام الترجمة الآلية العصبية ، المستخدم لتدريب نماذج الترجمة ، باستخدام البيانات المتوازية المتاحة للجمهور فقط. أظهر التحليل الأولي لمخرجات الترجمة أن الجودة دون المستوى الأمثل ، ويرجع ذلك أساسًا إلى عدم كفاية كمية بيانات التدريب. لتحسين جودة الترجمة ، تم اقتراح حل هجين ، باستخدام مجموعة من أنظمة NMT البسيطة نسبيًا المدربة بمقاييس مختلفة ، جنبًا إلى جنب مع وحدة نمطية مفتوحة المصدر ، مصممة لنظام الترجمة الآلية منخفض الموارد. النتائج التجريبية للطريقة المهجنة المقترحة مع مجموعات اختبار مستقلة متعددة تحقق تحسينات على (1) أفضل NMT فردي و (2) نظام المجموعة القياسي المقدم في نظام Marian-NMT. التحسينات على Marian-NMT ذات دلالة إحصائية في كثير من الحالات. أخيرًا ، يشير التحليل النوعي لنتائج الترجمة إلى قوة أكبر للطريقة المهجنة.', 'fr': "Le présent article explique comment améliorer la qualité de la traduction lorsque l'on utilise des données d'apprentissage limitées pour traduire vers des langues morphologiquement riches. Le point de départ est un système de TA neuronale, utilisé pour entraîner des modèles de traduction, en utilisant uniquement des données parallèles accessibles au public. Une première analyse des résultats de traduction a montré que la qualité n'est pas optimale, principalement en raison d'une quantité insuffisante de données d'entraînement. Pour améliorer la qualité de la traduction, une solution hybride est proposée, utilisant un ensemble de systèmes NMT relativement simples formés avec différentes métriques, combinés à un module open source, conçu pour un système de traduction automatique à faibles ressources. Les résultats expérimentaux de la méthode hybridée proposée avec de multiples ensembles de tests indépendants permettent d'obtenir des améliorations par rapport (i) à la fois au meilleur NMT individuel et (ii) au système d'ensemble standard fourni dans le système Marian-NMT. Les améliorations par rapport à Marian-NMT sont dans de nombreux cas statistiquement significatives. Enfin, une analyse qualitative des résultats de traduction indique une plus grande robustesse de la méthode hybridée.", 'es': 'El presente artículo analiza cómo mejorar la calidad de la traducción cuando se utilizan datos de capacitación limitados para traducir a idiomas ricos morfológicamente. El punto de partida es un sistema de MT neuronal, que se utiliza para entrenar modelos de traducción, utilizando únicamente datos paralelos disponibles públicamente. Un análisis inicial del resultado de la traducción ha demostrado que la calidad no es óptima, debido principalmente a una cantidad insuficiente de datos de entrenamiento. Para mejorar la calidad de la traducción, se propone una solución hibridada, que utiliza un conjunto de sistemas NMT relativamente simples entrenados con diferentes métricas, combinados con un módulo de código abierto, diseñado para un sistema de MT de bajos recursos. Los resultados experimentales del método hibridado propuesto con múltiples conjuntos de pruebas independientes logran mejoras con respecto a (i) tanto la mejor NMT individual como (ii) el sistema de conjunto estándar proporcionado en el sistema de NMT mariana. Las mejoras con respecto a la NMT mariana son en muchos casos estadísticamente significativas. Finalmente, un análisis cualitativo de los resultados de la traducción indica una mayor robustez para el método hibridado.', 'pt': 'O presente artigo discute como melhorar a qualidade da tradução ao usar dados de treinamento limitados para traduzir para idiomas morfologicamente ricos. O ponto de partida é um sistema MT neural, usado para treinar modelos de tradução, usando apenas dados paralelos disponíveis publicamente. Uma análise inicial da saída da tradução mostrou que a qualidade está abaixo do ideal, devido principalmente a uma quantidade insuficiente de dados de treinamento. Para melhorar a qualidade da tradução, é proposta uma solução hibridizada, usando um conjunto de sistemas NMT relativamente simples treinados com diferentes métricas, combinados com um módulo de código aberto, projetado para um sistema MT de poucos recursos. Os resultados experimentais do método hibridizado proposto com vários conjuntos de teste independentes alcançam melhorias em (i) tanto o melhor NMT individual quanto (ii) o sistema de conjunto padrão fornecido no sistema Marian-NMT. As melhorias em relação ao Marian-NMT são, em muitos casos, estatisticamente significativas. Por fim, uma análise qualitativa dos resultados da tradução indica uma maior robustez para o método hibridizado.', 'ja': 'この記事では、限定的なトレーニングデータを使用して形態学的に豊かな言語に向けて翻訳する際に、翻訳品質を向上させる方法について説明します。 出発点は、公的に入手可能な並列データのみを使用して、翻訳モデルをトレーニングするために使用されるニューラルMTシステムです。 翻訳出力の初期分析では、主にトレーニングデータの量が不十分であるため、品質が最適ではないことが示されています。 翻訳品質を向上させるために、異なるメトリックで訓練された比較的単純なNMTシステムのアンサンブルを使用して、低リソースMTシステム用に設計されたオープンソースモジュールと組み合わせて、ハイブリッド化されたソリューションが提案されています。 複数の独立した試験装置を用いた提案されたハイブリダイゼーション方法の実験結果は、（ ｉ ）最良の個々のＮＭＴと（ ｉ ｉ ） Ｍａｒｉａｎ － ＮＭＴシステムに提供される標準的なアンサンブルシステムの両方に対して改善を達成する。 Marian - NMTに対する改善は、多くの場合、統計的に有意である。 最後に、翻訳結果の定性分析は、ハイブリダイゼーションされた方法のより大きな堅牢性を示す。', 'zh': '本文论用有限之数翻译成形容丰衍之语,何以重译质? 初为一神经机器翻译统,以练译模,用仅公可并行数。 译输之初分析表明,质量不佳,盖训练数据量不足也。 夫崇译质,立混合解决方案,用指标练之 NMT ,合为低资源机器翻译计之开源模块。 所建独试杂交法者实验视(i)最佳者NMT与(ii)Marian-NMT系统中准集成系统改进。 夫众情者,比Marian-NMT而统计学著也。 最后定性分析表明杂交法有大鲁棒性。', 'hi': 'वर्तमान लेख चर्चा करता है कि रूपात्मक रूप से समृद्ध भाषाओं की ओर अनुवाद करने के लिए सीमित प्रशिक्षण डेटा का उपयोग करते समय अनुवाद की गुणवत्ता में सुधार कैसे किया जाए। प्रारंभिक बिंदु एक तंत्रिका एमटी प्रणाली है, जिसका उपयोग अनुवाद मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए किया जाता है, केवल सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध समानांतर डेटा का उपयोग करके। अनुवाद आउटपुट के एक प्रारंभिक विश्लेषण से पता चला है कि गुणवत्ता उप-इष्टतम है, मुख्य रूप से प्रशिक्षण डेटा की अपर्याप्त मात्रा के कारण। अनुवाद की गुणवत्ता में सुधार करने के लिए, एक संकरित समाधान प्रस्तावित किया गया है, जो अपेक्षाकृत सरल एनएमटी सिस्टम के एक पहनावे का उपयोग करके विभिन्न मीट्रिक के साथ प्रशिक्षित किया गया है, जो एक ओपन सोर्स मॉड्यूल के साथ संयुक्त है, जिसे कम संसाधन एमटी सिस्टम के लिए डिज़ाइन किया गया है। कई स्वतंत्र परीक्षण सेटों के साथ प्रस्तावित संकरण विधि के प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम (i) दोनों सबसे अच्छे व्यक्तिगत NMT और (ii) Marian-NMT प्रणाली में प्रदान की गई मानक पहनावा प्रणाली पर सुधार प्राप्त करते हैं। मैरियन-एनएमटी पर सुधार कई मामलों में सांख्यिकीय रूप से महत्वपूर्ण हैं। अंत में, अनुवाद परिणामों का एक गुणात्मक विश्लेषण संकरीकृत विधि के लिए अधिक मजबूती को इंगित करता है।', 'ru': 'В настоящей статье обсуждается, как улучшить качество перевода при использовании ограниченных данных обучения для перевода на морфологически богатые языки. Отправной точкой является нейронная система MT, используемая для обучения моделей перевода, используя исключительно общедоступные параллельные данные. Первоначальный анализ результатов письменного перевода показал, что качество является неоптимальным, главным образом из-за недостаточного объема данных о профессиональной подготовке. Для улучшения качества перевода предлагается гибридное решение, использующее совокупность относительно простых систем NMT, обученных различным метрикам, в сочетании с модулем с открытым исходным кодом, предназначенным для системы MT с низким ресурсом. Экспериментальные результаты предложенного гибридизированного метода с несколькими независимыми наборами тестов достигают улучшений по сравнению с (i) лучшей индивидуальной НБ и (ii) стандартной системой ансамбля, предоставленной в системе Marian-NMT. Улучшения по сравнению с Marian-NMT во многих случаях статистически значимы. Наконец, качественный анализ результатов перевода указывает на большую устойчивость гибридизованного метода.', 'ga': 'Pléann an t-alt seo conas cáilíocht an aistriúcháin a fheabhsú agus sonraí teoranta oiliúna á n-úsáid chun aistriú go teangacha atá saibhir ó thaobh moirfeolaíochta de. Is é an pointe tosaigh ná córas néar MT, a úsáidtear chun samhlacha aistriúcháin a oiliúint, ag baint úsáide as sonraí comhthreomhara atá ar fáil go poiblí amháin. Tá sé léirithe ag anailís tosaigh ar an aschur aistriúcháin go bhfuil an cháilíocht fo-optamach, go príomha toisc nach bhfuil dóthain sonraí oiliúna ann. Chun cáilíocht an aistriúcháin a fheabhsú, moltar réiteach hibridithe, ag baint úsáide as ensemble de chórais NMT sách simplí atá oilte le méadracht dhifriúil, in éineacht le modúl foinse oscailte, atá deartha do chóras MT íseal-acmhainne. Baineann torthaí turgnamhacha an mhodha hibridithe atá beartaithe le hiliomad tacair tástála neamhspleácha amach feabhsuithe thar (i) an NMT aonair is fearr agus (ii) an córas ensemble caighdeánach a chuirtear ar fáil sa chóras Marian-NMT. Tá feabhsuithe thar Marian-NMT suntasach go staitistiúil i go leor cásanna. Ar deireadh, léiríonn anailís cháilíochtúil ar thorthaí aistriúcháin go bhfuil an modh hibrideach níos láidre.', 'el': 'Το παρόν άρθρο συζητά πώς να βελτιωθεί η ποιότητα της μετάφρασης όταν χρησιμοποιούνται περιορισμένα δεδομένα κατάρτισης για τη μετάφραση σε μορφολογικά πλούσιες γλώσσες. Το σημείο εκκίνησης είναι ένα νευρωνικό σύστημα ΜΤ, που χρησιμοποιείται για την εκπαίδευση μεταφραστικών μοντέλων, χρησιμοποιώντας αποκλειστικά διαθέσιμα στο κοινό παράλληλα δεδομένα. Μια αρχική ανάλυση του μεταφραστικού αποτελέσματος έδειξε ότι η ποιότητα είναι ανεπαρκής, κυρίως λόγω ανεπαρκούς αριθμού δεδομένων κατάρτισης. Για τη βελτίωση της ποιότητας της μετάφρασης προτείνεται μια υβριδική λύση, χρησιμοποιώντας ένα σύνολο σχετικά απλών συστημάτων εκπαιδευμένων με διαφορετικές μετρήσεις, σε συνδυασμό με μια ενότητα ανοικτού κώδικα, σχεδιασμένη για ένα σύστημα ΜΤ χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας σε πόρους. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα της προτεινόμενης υβριδικής μεθόδου με πολλαπλά ανεξάρτητα σύνολα δοκιμών επιτυγχάνουν βελτιώσεις σε σχέση με (i) τόσο με το καλύτερο ατομικό NMT όσο και (ii) με το τυποποιημένο σύνολο που παρέχεται στο σύστημα Μαριάν-NMT. Οι βελτιώσεις έναντι της Μαριάνιας-NMT είναι σε πολλές περιπτώσεις στατιστικά σημαντικές. Τέλος, μια ποιοτική ανάλυση των αποτελεσμάτων της μετάφρασης δείχνει μεγαλύτερη ανθεκτικότητα για τη υβριδική μέθοδο.', 'ka': 'მიმდინარე წილაკის განსაზღვრება როგორ უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო პირველი წერტილი არის ნეიროლური MT სისტემი, რომელიც გამოყენებული თავისწორების მოდელების გარგება, მხოლოდ ადამიანურად ხელმისაწყებული პარალელური მონაც თავისუფალური გამოყენების დასაწყისი ანალიზი გამოჩენა, რომ საფუძველური უფრო ოპტიმალური იყო, რადგან უფრო მსგავსი მონაცემების მონაცემების გადაწყვეტილების კაalitეტის უფრო მეტრიკის გასაკეთებლად, ჰიბრიზებული პასუხის გამოყენება, გამოყენება relatively simple NMT სისტემების გასაკეთებული განსხვავებული მეტრიკებით, რომელიც გახსნილი ფოსური მოდულის მრავალ განსაზღვრებული ტესტის გამოყენებული ჰიბრიზიზებული პროცემის გამოცდილება (i) უკეთესი განსაზღვრებული NMT და (ii) მარიან-NMT სისტემაში დამუშავებული სტანდარტური ანსენბლის სისტემა მარიან-NMT-ზე უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია სტატისტიკურად მნიშვნელოვანია. საბოლოოდ, კვალიტატიური ანალიზია შეცვლის შედეგების უფრო ძალიან ძალიან ჰიბრიზებული მეტისთვის.', 'it': "Il presente articolo discute come migliorare la qualità della traduzione quando si utilizzano dati di formazione limitati per tradurre verso lingue morfologicamente ricche. Il punto di partenza è un sistema MT neurale, utilizzato per formare modelli di traduzione, utilizzando esclusivamente dati paralleli disponibili pubblicamente. Un'analisi iniziale dei risultati della traduzione ha dimostrato che la qualità non è ottimale, principalmente a causa della quantità insufficiente di dati di formazione. Per migliorare la qualità della traduzione, viene proposta una soluzione ibrida, utilizzando un insieme di sistemi NMT relativamente semplici formati con metriche diverse, combinati con un modulo open source, progettato per un sistema MT a basso consumo di risorse. I risultati sperimentali del metodo ibrido proposto con più gruppi di test indipendenti ottengono miglioramenti rispetto (i) sia al miglior NMT individuale che (ii) al sistema di ensemble standard fornito nel sistema Marian-NMT. I miglioramenti rispetto al Marian-NMT sono in molti casi statisticamente significativi. Infine, un'analisi qualitativa dei risultati della traduzione indica una maggiore robustezza per il metodo ibridato.", 'hu': 'Jelen cikk arról beszél, hogyan lehet javítani a fordítási minőséget, ha korlátozott képzési adatokat használ morfológiailag gazdag nyelvekre fordítani. A kiindulási pont egy neurális MT rendszer, amelyet fordítási modellek képzésére használnak, kizárólag nyilvánosan elérhető párhuzamos adatokat használva. A fordítási eredmények első elemzése azt mutatta, hogy a minőség nem optimális, főként a képzési adatok nem elegendő mennyiségének köszönhetően. A fordítási minőség javítása érdekében hibridizált megoldást javasolunk, amely viszonylag egyszerű, különböző mérőszámokkal képzett NMT rendszerekből áll, kombinálva egy nyílt forráskódú modullal, amely alacsony erőforrású MT rendszerhez tervezett. A javasolt hibridizált módszer több független tesztkészlettel történő kísérleti eredményei javulást érnek el (i) mind a legjobb egyéni NMT, mind (ii) a Marian-NMT rendszerben biztosított standard együttes rendszer felett. A Marian-NMT javulása sok esetben statisztikailag szignifikáns. Végül a fordítási eredmények minőségi elemzése nagyobb robusztusságot mutat a hibridizált módszer számára.', 'ms': 'Artikel ini membahas bagaimana memperbaiki kualiti terjemahan bila menggunakan data latihan terbatas untuk terjemahan ke bahasa yang kaya secara morfologik. The starting point is a neural MT system, used to train translation models, using solely publicly available parallel data.  Analisis awal output terjemahan telah menunjukkan kualiti adalah sub-optimal, terutamanya disebabkan jumlah data latihan yang tidak cukup. Untuk meningkatkan kualiti terjemahan, satu penyelesaian hibridisasi dicadangkan, menggunakan kumpulan sistem NMT relatif sederhana dilatih dengan metrik berbeza, bergabung dengan modul sumber terbuka, direka untuk sistem MT sumber rendah. Hasil percubaan kaedah hibridisasi yang diusulkan dengan set ujian bebas berbilang mencapai peningkatan atas (i) kedua-dua NMT individu terbaik dan (ii) sistem ensemble piawai yang disediakan dalam sistem Marian-NMT. Perbaikan atas Marian-NMT dalam banyak kes adalah statistik signifikan. Akhirnya, analisis kualitatif keputusan terjemahan menunjukkan kekuatan yang lebih besar untuk kaedah hibridisasi.', 'lt': 'Šiame straipsnyje aptariama, kaip gerinti vertimo kokybę naudojant ribotus mokymo duomenis vertimui į morfologiškai turtingas kalbas. Pradinis taškas yra neurologinė MT sistema, naudojama vertimo modeliams treniruoti, naudojant tik viešai prieinamus lygiagrečius duomenis. Pradinė vertimo rezultatų analizė parodė, kad kokybė yra nepakankamai optimali, daugiausia dėl nepakankamo mokymo duomenų kiekio. Siekiant pagerinti vertimo kokybę, siūlomas hibridizuotas sprendimas, naudojant palyginti paprastų NMT sistemų, parengtų įvairiomis metrinėmis priemonėmis, komplektą ir atvirojo šaltinio modulį, skirtą mažai išteklių naudojančiai MT sistemai. Siūlomo hibridizuoto metodo, kuriame naudojami keli nepriklausomi bandymų rinkiniai, eksperimentiniai rezultatai padeda pagerinti i) geriausią atskirą NMT sistemą ir ii) Marian-NMT sistemoje numatytą standartinę komplekso sistemą. Daugeliu atvejų statistiškai reikšmingas Marian-NMT pagerėjimas. Galiausiai kokybinė vertimo rezultatų analizė rodo didesnį hibridizuoto metodo patikimumą.', 'kk': 'Қазіргі мақала морфологиялық баяны тілдерге аудару үшін шектелген оқыту деректерін қолданғанда аудару сапатын қалай жақсарту үшін жауап береді. Бастау нүктесі - жалпы параллель деректерді қолдану үшін, аудару үлгілерін оқыту үшін невралдық MT жүйесі. Аудару шығысының бастапқы анализ сапасы төменгі оптималдық деп көрсетілді, негізінде оқыту деректері жеткіліксіз. Аударманың сапасын жақсарту үшін гибридизацияланған шешім қолданылады. Төмен ресурстар MT жүйесі үшін құрылған қарапайым NMT жүйелерін басқа метрикалық метрикалық көзі мен біріктірілген ашық көзі модулімен Бірнеше тәуелсіз сынақтардың гибридизациялық әдістерінің эксперименталдық нәтижелері: i) және ii) Marian- NMT жүйесінде келтірілген стандартты жүйесінің ең жақсы NMT жүйесінде жақсы жақсартылығын же Мариан-NMT арқылы жақсартулар көп жағдайда статистикалық маңызды. Соңында, аудармалардың квалификациялық анализ нәтижелері гибридизациялық тәсілінің күштігін көрсетеді.', 'mt': 'Dan l-artikolu jiddiskuti kif għandha tittejjeb il-kwalità tat-traduzzjoni meta tintuża dejta limitata tat-taħriġ għat-traduzzjoni lejn lingwi morfoloġikament rikki. Il-punt tat-tluq huwa sistema MT newrali, użata għat-taħriġ ta’ mudelli ta’ traduzzjoni, bl-użu ta’ dejta parallel a disponibbli biss għall-pubbliku. Analiżi inizjali tal-output tat-traduzzjoni wriet li l-kwalità mhijiex ottimali, prinċipalment minħabba ammont insuffiċjenti ta’ dejta ta’ taħriġ. To improve translation quality, a hybridized solution is proposed, using an ensemble of relatively simple NMT systems trained with different metrics, combined with an open source module, designed for a low-resource MT system.  Ir-riżultati esperimentali tal-metodu ibridizzat propost b’settijiet ta’ testijiet indipendenti multipli jiksbu titjib fuq (i) kemm l-aħjar NMT individwali kif ukoll (ii) is-sistema ta’ ensemble standard ipprovduta fis-sistema Marian-NMT. It-titjib fuq Marian-NMT f’ħafna każijiet huwa statistikament sinifikanti. Fl-a ħħar nett, analiżi kwalitattiva tar-riżultati tat-traduzzjoni tindika robustezza akbar għall-metodu ibridizzat.', 'mk': 'Оваа статија дискутира како да се подобри квалитетот на превод кога се користат ограничени податоци за обука за превод кон морфолошки богати јазици. Почнувачката точка е неврален МТ систем, кој се користи за обука на модели за превод, користејќи само јавно достапни паралелни податоци. An initial analysis of the translation output has shown that quality is sub-optimal, due mainly to an insufficient amount of training data.  За подобрување на квалитетот на преводот, се предложува хибридизирано решение, користејќи ансембл релативно едноставни НМТ системи обучени со различни метрики, комбинирани со модул на отворен код, дизајниран за систем на мал ресурс МТ. Експерименталните резултати на предложениот хибридизиран метод со повеќе независни тестови постигнуваат подобрувања во однос на (i) и најдобриот индивидуален НМТ, како и (ii) стандардниот ансамблен систем обезбеден во системот Маријан-НМТ. Подобрувањата во врска со Маријан-НМТ во многу случаи се статистички значајни. Конечно, квалитетната анализа на резултатите на преводот покажува поголема силност за хибридизираниот метод.', 'ml': 'ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ രേഖയിലുള്ള ലേഖനം മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d സമ്പന്നഭാഷകളിലേക്ക് പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d  ആരംഭിക്കുന്ന പോയിന്റ് ഒരു നെയൂറല്\u200d എംടി സിസ്റ്റമാണ്, പരിഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത്,  പരിഭാഷപൂട്ടിന്റെ ആദ്യമായ ഒരു അന്വേഷണം കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d ഗുണപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ഉപാധിയാണെന്നു് കാണിച് വ്യത്യസ്ത മെട്രിക്കളുമായി പരിശീലിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ഹൈബ്രിഡ്യൂട്ടിലേക്കുള്ള സിസ്റ്റം ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വ്യത്യസ്ത മെട്രിക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഒരു ഹൈബ്രിഡ ഒരുപാട് സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യ പരീക്ഷണസെറ്റുകളുമായി പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഹൈബ്രിഡീജ് രീതിയിലെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നു (i) മാരിയാന്\u200d -NMT സി മറിയാന്\u200d -NMT-നെക്കുറിച്ചുള്ള മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d പല കേസുകളിലും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അവസാനം, പരിഭാഷയുടെ ഫലങ്ങളുടെ ക്വാലിട്ടറിവേഷണ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നത് ഹൈബ്രിഡീസ് രീതിയിലേക്കാള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂ', 'mn': 'Харин одоогийн баримтууд хязгаарлагдсан дасгал өгөгдлийг ашиглан морфологийн баян хэл рүү хөгжүүлэхэд хэрхэн хөгжүүлэх талаар ярьдаг. Эхлэх цэг бол мэдрэлийн MT систем, хөрөнгө оруулах загваруудыг суралцах, зөвхөн олон нийтийн параллел өгөгдлийг ашигладаг. Үүний анхны шинжилгээ нь хэмжээний сургалтын өгөгдлийн хэмжээнд хангалтгүй хэмжээний шалтгааныг харуулсан. Ингээд хөгжүүлэх чадварыг сайжруулахын тулд гибриджүүлэгдсэн шийдэл санал өгдөг. Харин харьцангуй энгийн NMT системийн сургалтыг өөр хэлбэрээр сургалтыг ашиглаж, нээлттэй эх үүсвэрийн модультай холбогдож, ба Хибриджүүлэгдсэн аргын туршилтын үр дүнг олон тогтнолтой шалгалтын багц нь i) дээр хамгийн сайн NMT болон ii) мариан-NMT системд хангагдсан стандарт энзембл систем дээр сайжруулдаг. Мариан-НМТ дээр сайжруулах нь олон тохиолдолд статистикийн чухал. Эцэст нь, хөрөнгө оруулах үр дүний квалифицийн шинжилгээ нь гибриджүүлэх арга замыг илүү хүчтэй болгодог.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule omówiono, jak poprawić jakość tłumaczenia przy wykorzystaniu ograniczonych danych szkoleniowych do tłumaczenia na języki bogate morfologicznie. Punktem wyjścia jest neuronowy system MT, wykorzystywany do treningu modeli tłumaczeń, wykorzystujący wyłącznie publicznie dostępne dane równoległe. Wstępna analiza wyników tłumaczeniowych wykazała, że jakość jest nieoptymalna, głównie ze względu na niewystarczającą ilość danych szkoleniowych. Aby poprawić jakość tłumaczeń, proponuje się hybrydyzowane rozwiązanie, wykorzystujące zespół stosunkowo prostych systemów NMT przeszkolonych z różnymi metrykami, w połączeniu z modułem open source, przeznaczonym dla niskich zasobów systemu MT. Wyniki eksperymentalne proponowanej metody hybrydyzowanej z wieloma niezależnymi zestawami testowymi osiągają ulepszenia zarówno nad (i) najlepszym indywidualnym NMT, jak i (ii) standardowym systemem zespołowym dostarczonym w systemie Marian-NMT. Poprawa nad Marian-NMT jest w wielu przypadkach istotna statystycznie. Wreszcie analiza jakościowa wyników tłumaczenia wskazuje na większą solidność metody hybrydyzowanej.', 'no': 'Denne artikkelen diskuterer korleis omsetjingskvalitet skal forbetrast når du brukar begrenset øvingsdata for å omsetja til morfologisk rike språk. Startpunktet er eit neuralt MT- system som vert brukt til å trenja omsetjingsmodular med berre tilgjengelege parallelle data. Ein opprinnelig analyse av oversettelsutdata har vist at kvaliteten er underoptimalt, fordi hovudsakelig ikkje er tilstrekkelig mange øvingsdata. For å forbetra omsetjingskvalitet, foreslår ein hybridisert løysing ved å bruka eit ensembel av relativt enkle NMT- systemer trent med ulike metrikar, kombinert med ein opna kjeldemodul, utforma for ein låg- ressurssystemet MT. Eksperimentale resultat av den foreslåde hybridiserte metoden med fleire uavhengige testsett gjer forbedringar over i) både den beste individuelle NMT og ii) standardsystemet som er tilgjengeleg i Marian-NMT-systemet. Forbedringar over Marian-NMT er i mange tilfeller statistisk signifikant. Ein kvalitativ analyse av oversettelsesresultatet viser ein større kraftighet for hybridiserte metoden.', 'ro': 'Prezentul articol discută cum se poate îmbunătăți calitatea traducerii atunci când se utilizează date limitate de formare pentru a traduce către limbi bogate din punct de vedere morfologic. Punctul de plecare este un sistem MT neural, utilizat pentru a instrui modele de traducere, folosind doar date paralele disponibile publicului. O analiză inițială a rezultatelor traducerii a arătat că calitatea este suboptimă, datorită în principal cantității insuficiente de date de formare. Pentru a îmbunătăți calitatea traducerii, se propune o soluție hibridizată, utilizând un ansamblu de sisteme NMT relativ simple instruite cu diferite metrici, combinate cu un modul open source, conceput pentru un sistem MT cu resurse reduse. Rezultatele experimentale ale metodei hibridizate propuse cu mai multe seturi de teste independente obțin îmbunătățiri față de (i) atât de cel mai bun NMT individual, cât și (ii) sistemul standard de ansamblu furnizat în sistemul Marian-NMT. Îmbunătățirile față de Marian-NMT sunt în multe cazuri semnificative statistic. În cele din urmă, o analiză calitativă a rezultatelor traducerii indică o mai mare robustețe pentru metoda hibridă.', 'sr': 'U sadašnjem članku se razgovara o tome kako poboljšati kvalitet prevođenja kada koristi ograničene podatke obuke za prevođenje prema morfološki bogatim jezicima. Početna tačka je neuralni MT sistem koji se koristi za obuku modela prevođenja, koristeći samo javno dostupne paralelne podatke. Početna analiza izlaza prevođenja pokazala je da je kvalitet podoptimalna, zbog čega je uglavnom nedovoljna količina podataka o obuci. Da bi se poboljšalo kvalitet prevoda, predloženo je hibridizovano rješenje, koristeći kompleks relativno jednostavnih NMT sistema obučenih sa različitim metrikama, kombinovan sa modulom otvorenog izvora, dizajniranim za sistem MT sa niskim resursima. Eksperimentalni rezultati predložene hibridizirane metode sa višestrukim nezavisnim testovima postižu poboljšanje iznad i) i najboljih pojedinačnih NMT-a i ii) standardnog ensembliranog sistema pruženog u Marijanskom-NMT-u. Poboljšanje Mariana-NMT je u mnogim slučajevima statistički značajno. Konačno, kvalitativna analiza rezultata prevoda ukazuje na veću robustnost hibridiziranog metoda.', 'so': 'Warqadda joogtada ah wuxuu ka sheekaynayaa sida loo kordhinayo qiimaha turjumista marka lagu isticmaalayo macluumaadka waxbarashada xadgudbay si loo turjumo luqadaha hodanka ah. Xarunta bilowga waa nidaamka neurada ah ee MT, oo loo isticmaali karo tusaalaha turjumista, isticmaalaya macluumaadka lambarka ah oo kaliya. Baaritaanka hore ee midhaha turjumaanku wuxuu muujiyay in qiimaha ay tahay sub-optimal, sababtoo darteed ugu filan tirada waxbarashada. Si loo hagaajiyo qiimaha turjumaadda, waxaa la soo jeedaa xafiiska hybridized, using an ensemble of relatively fudud NMT systems oo lagu baray metric kala duduwan, oo lagu soo waday module furan sourceed oo loo qoray nidaamka hoos-resource MT. Imtixaanka kooxaha la soo jeeday oo ay leeyihiin kooxaha imtixaanka oo xor ah oo kala duduwan, waxay u baahan yihiin hagaajinta (i) ee ugu wanaagsan nidaamka caymiska ah ee ku qoran Marian-NMT. Horumarinta Marian-NMT waxey ku jiraan xaaladaha badan si statistic ah. Ugu dambaysta, baaritaanka arimaha turjumaadda waxaa looga muujiyaa qalabka aad u weyn.', 'sv': 'Denna artikel diskuterar hur man kan förbättra översättningskvaliteten när man använder begränsade utbildningsdata för att översätta till morfologiskt rika språk. Utgångspunkten är ett neuralt MT-system, som används för att träna översättningsmodeller med enbart allmänt tillgängliga parallella data. En inledande analys av översättningens resultat har visat att kvaliteten inte är optimal, främst på grund av otillräcklig mängd utbildningsdata. För att förbättra översättningskvaliteten föreslås en hybridiserad lösning, med hjälp av en uppsättning relativt enkla NMT-system utbildade med olika mätvärden, kombinerat med en öppen källkodsmodul, utformad för ett MT-system med låg resurs. Experimentella resultat av den föreslagna hybridiserade metoden med flera oberoende testset ger förbättringar jämfört med (i) både den bästa individuella NMT och (ii) standardensemblesystemet som tillhandahålls i Marian-NMT-systemet. Förbättringar jämfört med Marian-NMT är i många fall statistiskt signifikanta. Slutligen indikerar en kvalitativ analys av översättningsresultat en större robusthet för den hybridiserade metoden.', 'ur': 'موجود مقالہ کی بات کرتی ہے کہ کس طرح ترجمہ کیسی کیسی کیسی مزید ترجمہ کیسی کیسی کیسی ہے جب محدودہ ترجمہ دینے کے لئے محدودہ ڈیٹا استعمال کرتا ہے۔ شروع پوینٹ ایک نیورال مٹی سیسٹم ہے، ترجمہ موڈل کی ترکین کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے، صرف ظاہر طور پر موجود پارالی ڈاٹ کے استعمال کرتے ہیں. ترجمہ آئٹوٹ کے آغاز تحلیل نے دکھایا ہے کہ کیفیت زیادہ اچھی ہے، زیادہ دکھانے کے لئے زیادہ کافی اندازے کے لئے۔ تغییرات کی کیفیت کو بہتر کرنے کے لئے، ایک ہیبرائیز حل پیشنهاد کی جاتی ہے، ایک نسبتا ساده NMT سیستم کے استعمال سے مختلف متریک کے ساتھ تغییر کی جاتی ہے، ایک کھولی سورس موڈیول کے ساتھ، کم منطقی MT سیستم کے لئے طراحی کی جاتی ہے. پیشنهاد کی ہیبریڈیز طریقہ کی تجربے کی نتیجے بہت سی مستقل تست سٹوں کے ساتھ (i) سب سے بہترین شخصی NMT اور (ii) مریان-NMT سیسٹم میں پیشنهاد ہوئی استاندارڈیز انسبل سیسٹم کو پہنچاتے ہیں۔ Marian-NMT کے بارے میں بہت سی موارد میں اچھی باتیں ہیں۔ آخر میں، ترجمہ نتیجے کا ایک کیلوٹی تحلیل ہیبرائیز طریقے کے لئے بہت زیادہ طاقت دکھاتا ہے.', 'si': 'මේ ලේඛනය කතා කරනවා කොහොමද වාර්තාව ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂය වැඩ කරන්නේ සීමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නය දත්ත භාවිතා පටන් ගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණ ප්\u200dරදේශය තමයි න්\u200dයූරාල් MT පද්ධතියක්, භාවිත වාර්ථාපනය මදුල්ලය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන් පටන් ගත්ත ප්\u200dරවේශනයේ පටන් ගත්ත විශ්ලේෂණයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විශ්ලේෂණයක් පෙන්වන්නේ කියලා, ප්\u200dර වාර්ථාව කුළුවත් වැඩි කරන්න, හිබ්\u200dරිඩිස් විස්තරයක් ප්\u200dරවේශය කරනවා, සමාන්\u200dය සාමාන්\u200dය NMT පද්ධතියක් භාවිත කරනවා වෙනස් මෙට්\u200dරික් එක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ හිබ්\u200dරිඩිස් විධානය සමග විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණය සමග විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනවා (i) හොඳම මරියන්-NMT වලින් විශේෂ විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් ගොඩක් අවස්ථාවක් විශේෂයි. අන්තිමේදි, වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විශ්ලේෂණයක් තේරුම් කරනවා හිබ්\u200dරිඩිස් විධානය සඳහා විශ්ල', 'ta': 'தற்போதைய கட்டுரை துவங்கும் புள்ளி ஒரு புதிய MT அமைப்பு, மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மாதிரிகளை பயிற்சி செய்ய பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது, தனியாக பொத மொழிபெயர்ப்பு வெளியீட்டின் ஆரம்ப ஆய்வு காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, தரம் உப- optimal, முக்கியமாக பயிற்சி தரவு போதுமானது. மொழிபெயர்ப்பு தரம் மேம்படுத்த, ஒரு ஹைப்ரிடிசெட்ட தீர்வு பரிந்துரைக்கப்படுகிறது, சாதாரண எளிமையான NMT அமைப்புகள் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, வேறு மெட் பல்வேறு சுதந்திரமான சோதனை அமைப்புகளுடன் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முடிவுகளின் முடிவுகள் மேரியன்- NMT முறைமையில் கொடுக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது. மேரியன்-NMT மேலான முன்னேற்றம் பல நிகழ்வுகளில் புள்ளிவிவரம் முக்கியமானது. இறுதியாக, மொழிபெயர்ப்பு முடிவு', 'vi': 'Bài báo hôm nay đề cập đến cách cải thiện chất lượng dịch chuyển khi sử dụng dữ liệu giáo dục giới hạn để chuyển hướng sang ngôn ngữ có độ giàu có. Điểm khởi đầu là một hệ thống mạng lưới truyền dịch thần kinh, được dùng để huấn luyện các mô hình dịch, sử dụng các dữ liệu song song sẵn sàng công khai. Một cuộc phân tích đầu tiên của kết quả dịch đã cho thấy chất lượng kém tối ưu, chủ yếu là nhờ lượng chưa đủ dữ liệu đào tạo. Để cải thiện chất lượng dịch, một giải pháp đã được sắp xếp, sử dụng một kết hợp của hệ thống NMT tương đối đơn giản được huấn luyện với âm lượng khác nhau, kết hợp với một mô- đun nguồn mở, được thiết kế cho hệ thống MTV với nguồn ít tài nguyên. Kết quả thử nghiệm của phương pháp đã được thử nghiệm với nhiều bộ thử độc lập đã đạt được cải tiến trên cả bộ trình NMT riêng tốt nhất và cả hệ thống kết hợp tiêu chuẩn được cung cấp trong hệ thống Marian-NMT. Sự tiến bộ hơn về Marian-NMT là số trong số nhiều trường hợp tiềm ẩn. Cuối cùng, một phân tích chất lượng của kết quả dịch cho thấy khả năng chịu đựng hơn cho phương pháp lai hợp.', 'uz': "Name Boshlash point - tarjima modellarini taʼminlashga ishlatiladigan neyural MT tizim, faqat faqat boʻlgan parallel maʼlumot yordamida ishlatiladi. @ info @ info Bir necha boshqaruv sinov tizimi bilan ishlatilgan hybridiz natijasi natijalari (i) Marian-NMT tizimda koʻrsatilgan eng yaxshi oddiy shaxsiy NMT va (ii) standard ensemble tizimi bajaradi. Marian-NMT'ning o'zgarishlari ko'p holatda statistik muhim. Endi, tarjima natijalarining kvalifik analytiki hybrided usuli uchun katta ko'proq ko'rinadi.", 'bg': 'Настоящата статия разглежда как да се подобри качеството на превода при използване на ограничени данни за обучение за превод към морфологично богати езици. Началната точка е невронна МТ система, използвана за обучение на модели на превод, използваща единствено публично достъпни паралелни данни. Първоначалният анализ на резултатите от превода показа, че качеството е недостатъчно поради недостатъчното количество данни за обучение. За да се подобри качеството на превода, се предлага хибридизирано решение, използващо ансамбъл от сравнително прости НМТ системи, обучени с различни показатели, съчетани с модул с отворен код, проектиран за нискоресурсна МТ система. Експерименталните резултати от предложения хибридизиран метод с множество независими тестови комплекти постигат подобрения в сравнение както с най-добрия индивидуален НМТ, така и със стандартната ансамбълна система, предоставена в системата Мариан-НМТ. Подобренията спрямо Мариан-НМТ в много случаи са статистически значими. И накрая, качествен анализ на резултатите от превода показва по-голяма здравина за хибридизирания метод.', 'da': 'Denne artikel diskuterer, hvordan man kan forbedre oversættelseskvaliteten, når man bruger begrænsede træningsdata til at oversætte til morfologisk rige sprog. Udgangspunktet er et neuralt MT-system, der bruges til at træne oversættelsesmodeller, udelukkende ved hjælp af offentligt tilgængelige parallelle data. En første analyse af oversættelsesresultatet har vist, at kvaliteten ikke er optimal, hovedsagelig på grund af utilstrækkelige mængder uddannelsesdata. For at forbedre oversættelseskvaliteten foreslås en hybridiseret løsning ved hjælp af et ensemble af relativt enkle NMT-systemer, der er trænet med forskellige metrics, kombineret med et open source-modul, designet til et MT-system med lav ressource. Eksperimentelle resultater af den foreslåede hybridiserede metode med flere uafhængige testsæt opnår forbedringer i forhold til (i) både den bedste individuelle NMT og (ii) standardensemblesystemet i Marian-NMT systemet. Forbedringer i forhold til Marian-NMT er i mange tilfælde statistisk signifikante. Endelig indikerer en kvalitativ analyse af oversættelsesresultaterne en større robusthed for den hybridiserede metode.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel wordt besproken hoe de vertaalkwaliteit kan worden verbeterd bij het gebruik van beperkte trainingsgegevens om te vertalen naar morfologisch rijke talen. Het uitgangspunt is een neuraal MT-systeem, dat wordt gebruikt om vertaalmodellen te trainen, waarbij uitsluitend publiek beschikbare parallelle gegevens worden gebruikt. Uit een eerste analyse van de vertaaloutput is gebleken dat de kwaliteit suboptimaal is, vooral door onvoldoende trainingsdata. Om de vertaalkwaliteit te verbeteren, wordt een hybride oplossing voorgesteld, waarbij gebruik wordt gemaakt van een ensemble van relatief eenvoudige NMT-systemen getraind met verschillende metrics, gecombineerd met een open source module, ontworpen voor een MT-systeem met weinig resources. Experimentele resultaten van de voorgestelde hybride methode met meerdere onafhankelijke testsets bereiken verbeteringen ten opzichte van (i) zowel de beste individuele NMT als (ii) het standaard ensemblesysteem dat in het Marian-NMT systeem wordt geleverd. Verbeteringen ten opzichte van Marian-NMT zijn in veel gevallen statistisch significant. Tot slot wijst een kwalitatieve analyse van vertaalresultaten op een grotere robuustheid voor de hybride methode.', 'hr': 'U sadašnjem članku se razgovara o tome kako poboljšati kvalitet prevoda kada koristi ograničene podatke o obuci za prevod na morfološki bogate jezike. Početna tačka je neuralni MT sustav koji se koristi za obuku modela prevođenja, koristeći samo javno dostupne paralelne podatke. Početna analiza izlaza prevoda pokazala je da je kvalitet podoptimalna, zbog čega je uglavnom nedovoljna količina podataka o obuci. Za poboljšanje kvalitete prevoda, predlaže se hibridiziranje rješenja, koristeći kompleks relativno jednostavnih sustava NMT-a obučenih s različitim metrikama, kombiniran s modulom otvorenog izvora, dizajniranim za sustav MT-a s niskim resursima. Eksperimentalni rezultati predložene hibridizirane metode s višestrukim nezavisnim testovima ostvaruju poboljšanje iznad i) najboljih pojedinačnih NMT-a i ii) standardnog sustava ensembliranja pruženog u sustavu Marian-NMT-a. U mnogim slučajevima je statistički značajno poboljšanje prema Marian-NMT. Konačno, kvalitativna analiza rezultata prevođenja ukazuje na veću jakost hibridiziranog metoda.', 'de': 'Der vorliegende Artikel diskutiert, wie die Übersetzungsqualität verbessert werden kann, wenn begrenzte Trainingsdaten verwendet werden, um in morphologisch reiche Sprachen zu übersetzen. Ausgangspunkt ist ein neuronales MÜ-System, das zur Schulung von Übersetzungsmodellen verwendet wird, wobei ausschließlich öffentlich verfügbare parallele Daten verwendet werden. Eine erste Analyse der Übersetzungsausgaben hat gezeigt, dass die Qualität suboptimal ist, vor allem aufgrund unzureichender Schulungsdaten. Um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern, wird eine hybride Lösung vorgeschlagen, die ein Ensemble relativ einfacher NMT-Systeme verwendet, die mit verschiedenen Metriken trainiert sind, kombiniert mit einem Open-Source-Modul, das für ein ressourcenarmes MÜ-System entwickelt wurde. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse der vorgeschlagenen hybridisierten Methode mit mehreren unabhängigen Testsätzen erzielen Verbesserungen gegenüber (i) dem besten individuellen NMT und (ii) dem Standard-Ensemblesystem im Marian-NMT-System. Verbesserungen gegenüber Marian-NMT sind in vielen Fällen statistisch signifikant. Schließlich weist eine qualitative Analyse der Übersetzungsergebnisse auf eine größere Robustheit der hybridisierten Methode hin.', 'id': 'Artikel ini mendiskusikan bagaimana memperbaiki kualitas terjemahan ketika menggunakan data latihan terbatas untuk terjemahan ke bahasa yang kaya secara morfologis. Titik awal adalah sistem MT saraf, digunakan untuk melatih model terjemahan, menggunakan hanya data paralel yang tersedia publik. Analisi awal dari output terjemahan telah menunjukkan bahwa kualitas adalah sub-optimal, karena jumlah data latihan yang tidak cukup. Untuk meningkatkan kualitas terjemahan, sebuah solusi hibridisasi diusulkan, menggunakan ensemble dari sistem NMT relatif sederhana dilatih dengan metrik yang berbeda, kombinasi dengan modul sumber terbuka, dirancang untuk sistem MT sumber rendah. Hasil eksperimental dari metode hibridisasi yang diusulkan dengan beberapa set tes independen mencapai peningkatan atas (i) kedua individu terbaik NMT dan (ii) sistem ensemble standar yang disediakan dalam sistem Marian-NMT. Perbaikan dari Marian-NMT dalam banyak kasus statistik signifikan. Akhirnya, analisis kualitatif hasil terjemahan menunjukkan kekuatan yang lebih besar untuk metode hibridisasi.', 'fa': 'این مقاله در حال مطالعه می\u200cشود که چگونه کیفیت ترجمه را در حال استفاده از داده\u200cهای آموزش محدودیت برای ترجمه به زبانهای مورفولوژیک ثروتمند بهتر کند. نقطه آغاز یک سیستم MT عصبی است که برای آموزش مدل ترجمه استفاده می\u200cشود، با استفاده از داده\u200cهای پارالل به طور عمومی موجود است. یک تحلیل ابتدایی از نتیجه ترجمه نشان داده است که کیفیت زیر optimal است، زیرا به دلیل اندازه\u200cای از داده\u200cهای آموزش کافی نیست. برای تغییر کیفیت ترجمه، یک راه حل hybridized پیشنهاد می\u200cشود، با استفاده از سیستم\u200cهای نسبتا ساده NMT آموزش با متریک\u200cهای مختلف آموزش داده شده، با یک مدول منبع باز، طراحی برای سیستم MT منبع کم است. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه پیشنهاد روش hybridized با مجموعه\u200cهای آزمایش بسیاری مستقل به بهترین NMT و (i i) سیستم استاندارد انجمن استاندارد که در سیستم مریان-NMT ارائه می\u200cشود، به پیشرفت می\u200cرسد. توسعه\u200cهای مرییان-NMT در بسیاری از موارد آماری مهم است. بالاخره، یک تحلیل کیفیت نتیجه ترجمه نشان می دهد که یک استعداد بیشتر برای روش hybridized است.', 'sw': 'Makala ya sasa inajadili jinsi ya kuboresha ubora wa tafsiri wakati wa kutumia taarifa za mafunzo mipango ya kutafsiri kwa lugha matajiri ya kifolojia. The starting point is a neural MT system, used to train translation models, using solely publicly available parallel data.  Uchambuzi wa mwanzo wa matokeo ya tafsiri umeonyesha kuwa kiwango cha ubora, hasa kwa sababu ya kiasi cha takwimu za mafunzo yasiyoshosha. Ili kuboresha kiwango cha kutafsiri, suluhisho la utaratibu unapendekezwa, kwa kutumia mfumo rahisi wa NMT zilizofundishwa na mitindo tofauti, ikiunganishwa na kifaa cha wazi cha vyanzo, ambacho kinalengwa kwa mfumo wa MT wa chini wa rasilimali. Matokeo ya majaribio ya mbinu zilizopendekezwa na vipimo vingi vya majaribio huru vinaweza kupata maboresho zaidi (i) mifumo bora zaidi ya watu binafsi NMT na (ii) mfumo wa mfumo unaofanywa katika mfumo wa Marian-NMT. Mabadiliko ya Marian-NMT katika kesi nyingi ni muhimu sana. Mwisho, uchambuzi wa tatizo wa matokeo ya tafsiri unaonyesha ujenzi mkubwa wa namna hii inayotengenezwa.', 'ko': '본고는 유한한 훈련 데이터를 사용하여 형태학적 풍부한 언어를 대상으로 번역할 때 번역의 질을 어떻게 향상시키는지 토론하고자 한다.그 출발점은 신경기계 번역 시스템으로 번역 모델을 훈련하고 공개된 병렬 데이터만 사용하는 데 쓰인다.번역 출력에 대한 초보적인 분석에 의하면 품질이 최우선이고 주요 원인은 훈련 데이터량이 부족하기 때문이다.번역의 질을 높이기 위해 혼합 해결 방안을 제시했다. 상대적으로 간단한 NMT 시스템 집합을 사용하고 서로 다른 지표를 사용하여 훈련을 하고 저자원 기계 번역 시스템을 위한 소스 모듈을 결합시켰다.(i) 최고의 단일 NMT와 (ii) Marian NMT 시스템에서 제공하는 표준 계통 종합 시스템에 비해 여러 개의 독립된 테스트 집합을 가진 교잡 방법을 제안한 실험 결과가 개선되었다.많은 경우 Marian NMT와 비교한 개선은 통계학적으로 현저하다.마지막으로 번역 결과에 대한 정성 분석에 따르면 혼합 방법은 더욱 강한 노봉성을 가진다.', 'af': "Die huidige artikel bespreek hoe om vertaling kwaliteit te verbeter wanneer gebruik word beperkte onderwerking data om na morfologiese ryk tale te vertaal. Die begin punt is 'n neurale MT stelsel wat gebruik word om vertaling modele te oefen, gebruik slegs openlik beskikbaar parallele data. 'n Eenvoudige analisie van die vertaling uitset het vertoon dat kwaliteit sub- optimal is, gevolg hoofsaaklik tot 'n onvoldoende hoeveelheid onderwerp data. Om vertaling kwaliteit te verbeter, word 'n hibridiseerde oplossing voorgestel, gebruik 'n ensemble van relativies eenvoudige NMT stelsels wat opgelei is met verskillende metries, gekombineer met 'n oop bron module, ontwerp vir 'n lae-hulpbron MT stelsel. Eksperimentale resultate van die voorgestelde hybridiseerde metode met veelvuldige onhangbare toets stelle bereik verbeteringe oor (i) beide die beste individuele NMT en (ii) die standaard ensemble stelsel verskaf in die Marian-NMT stelsel. Verbeterings oor Marian-NMT is in baie gevalle statistiese betaling. Eindelik, 'n kwaliteit analiseer van vertaling resultate wys 'n groter kragtigheid vir die hybridiseerde metode.", 'sq': 'Artikli i tanishëm diskuton se si të përmirësohet cilësia e përkthimit kur përdoren të dhëna të kufizuara të trajnimit për të përkthyer drejt gjuhëve morfologjikisht të pasura. The starting point is a neural MT system, used to train translation models, using solely publicly available parallel data.  Një analizë fillestare e rezultatit të përkthimit ka treguar se cilësia është sub-optimale, kryesisht për shkak të një sasie të pamjaftueshme të dhënash të trajnimit. Për të përmirësuar cilësinë e përkthimit, propozohet një zgjidhje hibridizuar duke përdorur një komplet të sistemeve relativisht të thjeshta NMT të trajnuar me metrika të ndryshme, të kombinuar me një modul burimi të hapur, të dizajnuar për një sistem MT me burime të ulëta. Rezultatet eksperimentale të metodës së propozuar të hibridizuar me grupe të shumta testesh të pavarura arrijnë përmirësime mbi (i) si individual in më të mirë NMT dhe (ii) sistemin standard të ansamblit të ofruar në sistemin Marian-NMT. Përmirësimet mbi Marian-NMT janë në shumë raste statistikisht të rëndësishme. Më në fund, një analizë kualitative e rezultateve të përkthimit tregon një fuqi më të madhe për metodën hibridizuar.', 'tr': 'Häzirki maksada morfologik baý dillere terjime etmek üçin çykyş edilen terjime maksadynyň nähili gowuralygyny düşünýär. Başlangyç nokady neural MT sistemidir, terjime modellerini öwretmek üçin ullanýar, diňe publika parallel maglumatlary ulanýar. Terjime edilen başlangyç çykyşynyň başlangyç analyzasy görkezildi ki kwalitet azynyň optimaldyr, çünki birnäçe ýeterlik terjime edip biljek maglumatyň daty däldir. Terjime kwaliteti gelişmek üçin, hybridiziterli çözüm teklip edildi. Aç çeşme modüli bilen birleştirilýär, iň-çeşme MT sistemi üçin tasarlanýan relativ basit NMT sistemleriniň köpüsi ullanýar. Önerilen hybridleştirilen metiniň üstünlik netijesi birnäçe bağımsız test i ň düzümlerini (i) hem Marian-NMT sisteminde berilen iň gowy adamlaryň we (ii) iň gowy sistemini gelip bilýär. Marian-NMT üstünden gelişmeler birnäçe ýagdaýda statistiki wajypdyr. Soňunda, terjime netijeleriniň kynçylyklyk analyzasy hybridized yöntemi üçin has gaty güýçli bir şekilde görkezýär.', 'am': 'የአሁኑ ዕቅድ እንዴት ትርጉም ጥሩ እንዲያበጅል በተቃራኒ ትርጉም ዳታዎችን ለመዘርጋት በሞሮፎሎጂ ባለ ሀብታሞች ቋንቋዎች በመጠቀም ያስተካክላል፡፡ የመጀመሪያ ነጥብ የኩነቶች MT ስርዓት ነው፤ ትርጉም ሞዴላዎችን ለማስተማር በተጠቃሚ የተገኘ የparallel data በመጠቀም ተጠቃሚ ነው። An initial analysis of the translation output has shown that quality is sub-optimal, due mainly to an insufficient amount of training data.  ትርጉም ጥያቄን ለማሻሻል፣ የhybridized solution, በተለየ ልዩ ሜትሪክ የተማሩት ቀላል NMT systems በተጠቀም፣ በተከፈተ የክፈት source module በተመሳሳይ MT ስርዓት የተዘጋጀ ነው፡፡ በብዙ ነጻ ፈተና ተፈትኖ የተዘጋጀው የድምፅ ውጤቶች (i) በማርያም-NMT ስርዓት ውስጥ የተሰኘውን የአንድማዊ ስርዓት ድምፅ እና (ii) በሚያማርያ-NMT ስርዓት የሚደረገውን የድምፅ ስርዓት ማድረግ እንዲያገኛል፡፡ ማርያን-NMT ላይ የተለየ ቅድሚያ በብዙ ጉዳዮች በstatistically significant ናቸው፡፡ በመጨረሻው፣ ትርጓሜ ፍሬዎችን የሚያሳውቅ የተመሳሳይ ትርጓሜ የደብዳቤ ሥርዓት የሚበዛ ልብስ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը քննարկում է, թե ինչպես բարելավել թարգմանման որակը, երբ օգտագործվում են սահմանափակ ուսուցման տվյալներ, որոնք թարգմանվում են մորֆոլոգիապես հարուստ լեզուներով: Սկզբնական կետը նյարդային ՄԹ համակարգ է, որը օգտագործվում է թարգմանման մոդելների ուսումնասիրելու համար, օգտագործելով միայն հանրային հասանելի զուգահեռ տվյալներ: An initial analysis of the translation output has shown that quality is sub-optimal, due mainly to an insufficient amount of training data.  Թարգմանության որակի բարելավելու համար առաջարկում է հիբրիդացված լուծում, օգտագործելով համեմատաբար պարզ NMT համակարգերի համակարգ, որոնք վարժեցվում են տարբեր մետրիկներով, միասին բաց աղբյուր մոդուլների հետ, որոնք նախագծված են ցածր ռեսուրս Առաջարկված հիբրիդացված մեթոդի փորձարկման արդյունքները բազմաթիվ անկախ փորձարկումների համակարգերի միջոցով հասնում են բարելավման i) և լավագույն անհատական NMT-ի, և Մարիան-ՆՄԹ-ի վերաբերյալ զարգացումները շատ դեպքերում վիճակագրական կարևոր են: Finally, a qualitative analysis of translation results indicates a greater robustness for the hybridized method.', 'az': 'Şimdiki məlumat morfolojik zəngin dillərə çevirmək üçün qurğulu təhsil məlumatlarını istifadə edərkən tercümə keyfiyyətini necə yaxşılaşdırmağını mübahisə edir. Başlangıç noktası, çevirim modellərini təhsil etmək üçün istifadə edilən nöral MT sistemidir, sadəcə olaraq faydalanır paralel məlumatları. Tərcümə çıxışının başlanğıç analizi, keyfiyyətin altı-optimal olduğunu göstərdi, çünki ən çox təhsil verilən məlumatların kifayəti yoxdur. Tərcümə keyfiyyətini yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün hibridizlənmiş çətinlik təklif edilir, düşük kaynaqlar MT sistemi üçün təhsil edilmiş, müxtəlif metriklərlə təhsil edilmiş NMT sistemlərin ensembli istifadə edilir. Mərhəmətli hibridizləndirilmiş metodların təcrübəsi sonuçları çoxlu müstəsnadır sınaq quruları i) ilə Marian-NMT sistemində olan ən yaxşı individual NMT və ii) standart ensemble sistemini təşkil edir. Marian-NMT üzərində yaxşılıqlar statistik olaraq mövcuddur. Sonunda, tercümə sonuçlarının kvalitativ analizi hibridizlənmiş metodların daha qüvvətli olduğunu göstərir.', 'bn': 'বর্তমান প্রবন্ধ নিয়ে আলোচনা করেছে কিভাবে অনুবাদের মান উন্নত করা হবে যখন সীমিত প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য ব্যবহার করে মরোফোলগিক্য প্রথম বিন্দু হচ্ছে একটি নিউরেল এমটি সিস্টেম, যা অনুবাদ মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ করার জন্য ব্যবহৃত, শুধুমাত্র প্যারালেল ডা An initial analysis of the translation output has shown that quality is sub-optimal, due mainly to an insufficient amount of training data.  অনুবাদের মান উন্নত করার জন্য, একটি হাইব্রিডিজেড সমাধান প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে, যা বিভিন্ন মেট্রিক দ্বারা প্রশিক্ষিত একটি সাধারণ এনএমটি সিস্টেম ব্যবহার করে, একটি উন্ম প্রস্তাবিত হাইব্রিডিজ পদ্ধতির পরীক্ষার ফলাফল মারিয়ান-এনএমটি সিস্টেমে প্রস্তাবিত বেশ কিছু স্বাধীন পরীক্ষা ব্যবস্থায় উন্নতি পেয়েছে (i) আর (ii) সে অনেক ক্ষেত্রে মারিয়ান-এনএমটির উপর উন্নতি পরিসংখ্যানে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। অবশেষে, অনুবাদের ফলাফলের সম্মান বিশ্লেষণে হাইব্রিডিজ পদ্ধতির জন্য বেশী দুর্ঘটনা প্রকাশ করে।', 'bs': 'U sadašnjem članku se razgovara o tome kako poboljšati kvalitet prevođenja kada koristi ograničene podatke o obuci za prevođenje prema morfološki bogatim jezicima. Početna tačka je neuralni MT sistem koji se koristi za obuku modela prevođenja, koristeći samo javno dostupne paralelne podatke. Početna analiza izvedenog prevoda pokazala je da je kvalitet podoptimalna, zbog čega je uglavnom nedovoljna količina podataka o obuci. Da bi se poboljšalo kvalitet prevoda, predlaže se hibridizirano rješenje, koristeći kompleks relativno jednostavnih NMT sustava obučenih s različitim metrikama, kombiniran s modulom otvorenog izvora, dizajniranim za sistem MT niskog resursa. Eksperimentalni rezultati predložene hibridizirane metode sa višestrukim nezavisnim testovima ostvaruju poboljšanje iznad i) i najboljih pojedinaca NMT-a i ii) standardnog ensembliranog sistema pruženog u sustavu Mariana-NMT-a. U mnogim slučajevima je statistički značajno poboljšanje Mariana-NMT. Konačno, kvalitativna analiza rezultata prevoda ukazuje na veću robustnost hibridiziranog metoda.', 'cs': 'Tento článek pojednává o tom, jak zlepšit kvalitu překladu při použití omezených školicích dat k překladu do morfologicky bohatých jazyků. Výchozím bodem je neuronový MT systém, který se používá k tréninku překladových modelů, využívající výhradně veřejně dostupná paralelní data. První analýza překladových výstupů ukázala, že kvalita je suboptimální, zejména kvůli nedostatečnému množství tréninkových dat. Pro zlepšení kvality překladu je navrženo hybridizované řešení využívající soubor relativně jednoduchých NMT systémů trénovaných s různými metrikami, kombinovaný s open source modulem navrženým pro MT systém s nízkými zdroji. Experimentální výsledky navržené hybridizované metody s několika nezávislými testovacími sadami dosahují zlepšení oproti (i) nejlepšímu individuálnímu NMT a (ii) standardnímu souborovému systému poskytovanému v Marian-NMT systému. Zlepšení oproti Marian-NMT jsou v mnoha případech statisticky významné. Nakonec kvalitativní analýza výsledků překladu ukazuje na větší robustnost hybridizované metody.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis käsitletakse, kuidas parandada tõlkekvaliteeti piiratud koolitusandmete abil morfoloogiliselt rikkalikesse keeltesse tõlkimiseks. Lähtepunktiks on neuraalne MT süsteem, mida kasutatakse tõlkemudelite koolitamiseks, kasutades ainult avalikult kättesaadavaid paralleelseid andmeid. Tõlketulemuste esialgne analüüs näitas, et kvaliteet ei ole optimaalne peamiselt koolitusandmete ebapiisava hulga tõttu. Tõlkekvaliteedi parandamiseks pakutakse välja hübridiseeritud lahendus, mis kasutab suhteliselt lihtsate NMT süsteemide ansamblit, mis on koolitatud erinevate mõõdikutega, kombineeritud avatud lähtekoodiga mooduliga, mis on loodud madala ressursiga MT süsteemi jaoks. Mitme sõltumatu katsekomplektiga kavandatud hübridiseeritud meetodi eksperimentaalsed tulemused saavutavad parandusi i) nii parima individuaalse NMT kui ka ii) Marian-NMT süsteemi standardse ansambli süsteemi võrreldes. Paranemine Marian-NMT-ga võrreldes on paljudel juhtudel statistiliselt oluline. Lõpuks näitab tõlketulemuste kvalitatiivne analüüs hübridiseeritud meetodi suuremat tugevust.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa käsitellään, miten kääntämisen laatua voidaan parantaa käyttämällä rajallista koulutustietoa käännettäessä morfologisesti rikkaille kielille. Lähtökohtana on neuraalinen MT-järjestelmä, jota käytetään käännösmallien kouluttamiseen, käyttäen yksinomaan julkisesti saatavilla olevaa rinnakkaisdataa. Käännöstuotoksen alustava analyysi on osoittanut, että laatu ei ole optimaalista, mikä johtuu pääasiassa koulutustiedon riittämättömyydestä. Käännöslaadun parantamiseksi ehdotetaan hybridisoitua ratkaisua, jossa hyödynnetään suhteellisen yksinkertaisia NMT-järjestelmiä, jotka on koulutettu erilaisilla mittareilla, yhdistettynä avoimen lähdekoodin moduuliin, joka on suunniteltu vähäresurssiselle MT-järjestelmälle. Ehdotetun hybridityn menetelmän kokeelliset tulokset useiden riippumattomien testisarjojen kanssa saavuttavat parannuksia verrattuna (i) sekä parhaaseen yksittäiseen NMT:hen että (ii) Marian-NMT:n vakiokokoonpanojärjestelmään. Paraneminen Marian-NMT:hen verrattuna on monissa tapauksissa tilastollisesti merkitsevää. Lopuksi kvalitatiivinen käännöstuloksen analyysi osoittaa, että hybridisoitu menetelmä on vakaampi.', 'ca': "The present article discusses how to improve translation quality when using limited training data to translate towards morphologically rich languages.  El punt de partida és un sistema MT neural, utilitzat per formar models de traducció, utilitzant només dades paralleles disponibles al públic. Una an àlisi inicial de la traducció ha demostrat que la qualitat és sub-optimal, principalment degut a una quantitat insuficient de dades d'entrenament. Per millorar la qualitat de la traducció, es propone una solució híbrida, utilitzant un conjunt de sistemes NMT relativament senzills entrenats amb diferents mètriques, combinats amb un módul de codi obert, dissenyat per un sistema MT de baix recursos. Els resultats experimentals del mètode hibriditzat proposat amb múltiples conjunts de proves independents aconsegueixen millors sobre i) tant el millor NMT individual com (ii) el sistema d'ensembles estàndard proporcionat al sistema Marian-NMT. Improvements over Marian-NMT are in many cases statistically significant.  Finalment, una anàlisi qualitativa dels resultats de traducció indica una més robustesa del mètode híbriditzat.", 'jv': 'Where am I Mulai punt iku sistem Neral MT, Ngawe nggawe model tarjamahan, gambar data yang dipunarané Ukung beraksi inipun kanggo tarjamahan urip mbut-urip wong-wong kuwi kaliwat apa-Optimat, kaya ngono kuwi alamat mbut-urip kuwi ora cukup. Ukung nggawe kalitas itoleh, supoyo nggawe sistem HyBridge yang dipunanggap, gambar sistem NMT sing ditambang akeh barang sampeyan karo metir-sampeyan, ditambang karo modul bukas, ditambang kanggo sistem MT sing wis an a dadi. Rasane sing beraksi karo hal-hal nganggo sistem HyBridge padha uga ngerasah tentang sing luwih dumadhi kanggo kalagayan (i) sampek NMT lan (i) sistem sing gawe barang awak dhéwé nggawe sistem wis ambang nggawe marian-NMT. Gujaring kanggo marian-NMT kuwi ing dadi kapan dadi, dadi. Tulung ngono, akeh kaliwatirne dipolehasan pancene puteh dadi nggawe nguasai nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe modo HyBridge.', 'he': 'המאמר הנוכחי מדבר על איך לשפר את איכות התרגום כשמשתמשים בנתונים אימונים מוגבלים לתרגם לשפות עשירות מורפולוגית. נקודת ההתחלה היא מערכת MT עצבית, שמשתמשת לאימון דוגמני תרגום, בשימוש רק נתונים קבועים זמינים לציבור. ניתוח ראשון של תוצאת התרגום הראה כי איכות היא לא אופטימלית, בעיקר בגלל כמות לא מספקת של נתונים אימונים. כדי לשפר את איכות התרגום, מוצע פתרון היברידית, באמצעות אסמפל של מערכות NMT פשוטות יחסית מאומנות עם מטריות שונות, בשילוב עם מודול מקור פתוח, תוכנן למערכת MT משאבים נמוכים. תוצאות ניסויים של השיטה היברידית המוצעת עם מספר קבוצות מבחנים עצמאיים מגיעות לשיפורים מעל (i) גם NMT האישי הטוב ביותר וגם (ii) מערכת האנסמבל הסטנדרטית שנתת במערכת Marian-NMT. שיפורים בנוגע למריאן-אן-מט הם במקרים רבים סטטיסטית משמעותיים. סוף סוף, ניתוח איכותי של תוצאות התרגום מצביע על חזקה גדולה יותר לשיטה היברידית.', 'ha': "@ action: button @ info: whatsthis Ana ƙirari na farko wa fitarwa na fassarar aiki ya nuna cewa sifar-sub-Optical ne, mainli don ya kasa ƙidãya wa data na zaman shawarar. To, dõmin ya improve sifar fassarar, an buƙata wata shimfiɗar ɗabi'a, ana amfani da wani ensemble na'urar NMT na masu sauƙi na masu haɗi da shiryoyin dabam-dabam, da kuma a haɗe da module da ake buɗe, aka ƙayyade wa tsari na wuri-resource MT. Tajararin matsalar da aka buƙata hanyor Hybrised da wasu jarrabo masu da inganci masu yawa, sun ƙarfafa improvements over (i) da mafi kyaun kowanka na NMT da (ii) na daidaita na'urar ensemble wanda aka samar da shi a cikin tsarin Marian-NMT. Bakayi da Marian-NMT na cikin masu yawa, yana da statistically significant. Haƙari, wani anayyar da fassarar-fassarar na fassarar yana gaya wani mafi girma na hanyor wa hanyor hibiriki.", 'sk': 'Članek obravnava, kako izboljšati kakovost prevajanja pri uporabi omejenih podatkov o usposabljanju za prevajanje v morfološko bogate jezike. Izhodišče je nevronski MT sistem, ki se uporablja za usposabljanje prevajalskih modelov in uporablja izključno javno dostopne vzporedne podatke. Začetna analiza rezultatov prevajanja je pokazala, da je kakovost neoptimalna, predvsem zaradi nezadostne količine podatkov o usposabljanju. Za izboljšanje kakovosti prevajanja je predlagana hibridizirana rešitev z uporabo kompleta relativno preprostih NMT sistemov, usposobljenih z različnimi metrikami, v kombinaciji z odprtokodnim modulom, zasnovanim za sistem MT z nizkimi viri. Poskusni rezultati predlagane hibridizirane metode z več neodvisnimi preskusnimi sklopi dosegajo izboljšave v primerjavi z (i) najboljšim posameznim NMT in (ii) standardnim ansamblom sistemom, ki ga zagotavlja sistem Marian-NMT. Izboljšanje v primerjavi z Marian-NMT je v mnogih primerih statistično značilno. Končno, kvalitativna analiza rezultatov prevajanja kaže na večjo robustnost hibridizirane metode.', 'bo': 'The present article discusses how to improve translation quality when using limited training data to translate towards morphologically rich languages. འགོ་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ནི་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་མ་ལག་ཅིག་རེད། An initial analysis of the translation output has shown that quality is sub-optimal, due mainly to an insufficient amount of training data. To improve translation quality, a hybridized solution is proposed, using an ensemble of relatively simple NMT systems trained with different metrics, combined with an open source module, designed for a low-resource MT system. སྔོན་འཆར་བཀོད་ཡོད་པའི་ཆེ་བ་ལྟ་བུའི་གྲུབ་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་གྲུབ་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ཚད་གཞི་སྣ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྟར་ཡར་རྒྱས་ཟུར་བ་རེད། Marian-NMT ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་སྐབས་སུ་ཚད་རྩིས་ཅན་མང་པོ་ཡིན། མཐའ་མར་རང་གི་དབྱིབས་ཡུལ་གྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ཞིག་ནི་ཕྱིར་མཐོང་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཅན་ཞིག་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Data Augmentation for Voice-Assistant NLU using BERT-based Interchangeable Rephrase', 'ar': 'زيادة البيانات لـ Voice-Assistant NLU باستخدام إعادة صياغة قابلة للتبديل قائمة على BERT', 'fr': "Augmentation des données pour la NLU de l'assistant vocal à l'aide de la reformulation interchangeable basée sur BERT", 'es': 'Aumento de datos para NLU de asistente de voz mediante reformulación intercambiable basada en BERT', 'pt': 'Aumento de dados para NLU de assistente de voz usando reformulação intercambiável baseada em BERT', 'ja': 'BERTベースの交換可能な言い換えを使用した音声アシスタントNLUのデータ拡張', 'zh': '用BERT者互换语音助手NLU数增强', 'ru': 'Расширение данных для голосового NLU с использованием взаимозаменяемой перефразы на основе BERT', 'hi': 'BERT-आधारित विनिमेय Rephrase का उपयोग कर आवाज-सहायक NLU के लिए डेटा वृद्धि', 'ga': 'M챕ad첬 Sonra챠 le haghaidh NLU C첬nt처ra Gutha ag 첬s찼id Athfhr찼sa Idirmhalartaithe bunaithe ar BERT', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Adatbővítés hangasszisztens NLU-hoz BERT-alapú cserélhető újrafogalmazással', 'el': 'Ενίσχυση δεδομένων για τη φωνητική υποβοήθηση NLU με τη χρήση εναλλάξιμης διατύπωσης βασισμένης στο BERT', 'it': 'Aumento dei dati per NLU Voice-Assistant utilizzando la riformulazione intercambiabile basata su BERT', 'lt': 'Duomenų didinimas balso pagalbininko NLU naudojant BERT pagrįstą keičiamą formuluotę', 'kk': 'BERT- негіздеген интерфейсті қайта ауыстыру мүмкіндігін қолданатын NLU дыбыс- көмекшісінің деректерін көтеру', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Pembesaran Data untuk NLU Pembantu-Suara menggunakan Ubah Semula Berasas BERT', 'mt': 'Żieda fid-Dejta għal NLU Assistent tal-Vuċi bl-użu ta’ Riformi Interkambjabbli bbażati fuq BERT', 'no': 'Data- augmentasjon for stemmeassistent NLU med BERT- basert Interchangeable Rephrase', 'ml': 'BERT-അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള ഇന്റര്\u200dമാറ്റിവെക്കല്\u200d റിപ്രായേസ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ശബ്ദം- സഹായിക്കുന്ന NLU-നുള്ള ഡ', 'si': 'Name', 'mn': 'BERT-д суурилсан интерфейс өөрчлөгдөх боломжтой рефраз ашиглаж өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэлт NLU', 'pl': 'Rozszerzenie danych dla NLU głosowego asystenta głosowego za pomocą wymiennego sformułowania opartego na BERT', 'ro': 'Augmentarea datelor pentru NLU Voice-Assistant utilizând reformularea interschimbabilă bazată pe BERT', 'so': 'Ogeysiiska macluumaadka codka-kaalmada NLU isticmaalka Interchangeable Rephrase-based BERT', 'ta': 'Name', 'sv': 'Dataförstärkning för NLU för röstassistent med BERT-baserad utbytbar omformulering', 'ur': 'BERT-based Interchangeable Rephrase', 'sr': 'Povećavanje podataka za pomoćnik glasa NLU koristeći međuizmjenljiv rephras na BERT-u', 'vi': 'Phát triển dữ liệu Trợ lý giọng nói Ntrường dùng hỗn hợp giao dịch', 'uz': 'Name', 'hr': 'Povećavanje podataka za pomoćnika glasa NLU koristeći intermjenjivabilnu refrasu na BERT-u', 'da': 'Dataudvidelse til NLU med stemmeassistent ved hjælp af BERT-baseret udskiftelig omformulering', 'bg': 'Увеличаване на данни за гласов асистент НЛУ с използване на BERT-базирана взаимозаменяема реформа', 'nl': 'Data Augmentation voor Voice-Assistant NLU met behulp van BERT-gebaseerde uitwisselbare herschikking', 'de': 'Datenerweiterung für Voice-Assistant NLU mittels BERT-basierter austauschbarer Umformulierung', 'id': 'Augmentasi Data untuk Asisten Suara NLU menggunakan Refrase Berdasarkan BERT', 'ko': '버트 기반 음성 지원 NLU 데이터 확장', 'sw': 'Tovuti ya data kwa Msaidizi wa Sauti NLU kwa kutumia Rephrase inayoweza kubadilishwa kwa BERT', 'af': 'Data Augmentasie vir stem- assistent NLU gebruik BERT- gebaseerde Interchangeable Rephrase', 'fa': 'افزایش داده برای کمک صدا NLU با استفاده از بازگشت متغیر قابل تغییر بر BERT', 'tr': 'BERT tabanly Otomatik Gaýtalançylyk', 'sq': 'Rritja e të dhënave për ndihmësin e zërit NLU duke përdorur përmirësimin ndërndërmjetësues me bazë në BERT', 'hy': 'Տվյալների աճը ձայնի օգնականի ՆԼՀ-ի համար BER-ի հիմքով փոխակերպվող վերարտահայտում', 'am': 'የዳታ አቀማመጥ', 'bn': 'Name', 'az': 'BERT tabanl캼 Interchangeable Rephrase vasit톛sil톛 S톛s-Yard캼mc캼s캼 NLU 칲칞칲n m톛lumatlar캼 art캼rmaq', 'ca': "Aumentació de dades per l'assistent de veu NLU utilitzant la reforma intercanviable basada en BERT", 'cs': 'Rozšíření dat pro NLU hlasového asistenta pomocí výměnného formuláře založeného na BERT', 'bs': 'Povećavanje podataka za pomoćnika glasa NLU koristeći međumjenjujuću refrasu na BERT-u', 'fi': 'Tiedon lisääminen Voice-Assistant NLU:lle BERT-pohjaisen vaihdettavan uudelleenmuotoilun avulla', 'et': 'Andmete suurendamine hääleassistenti NLi jaoks BERT-põhise vahetatava ümberkujundamise abil', 'jv': 'Language', 'he': 'גידול נתונים עבור עוזר קול NLU בשימוש מחדש משתנה מבוסס על BERT', 'sk': 'Povečanje podatkov za glasovni asistent NLU z uporabo izmenljive popravke na podlagi BERT', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'BERT-based Interchangeable Rephrase ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་སྟེ། Voice-Assistant NLU་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་སྐྱེས་སྟངས་བཙུགས་གསལ་བརྗོད།'}
{'en': 'We introduce a data augmentation technique based on byte pair encoding and a BERT-like self-attention model to boost performance on spoken language understanding tasks. We compare and evaluate this method with a range of augmentation techniques encompassing generative models such as VAEs and performance-boosting techniques such as synonym replacement and back-translation. We show our method performs strongly on domain and intent classification tasks for a voice assistant and in a user-study focused on utterance naturalness and semantic similarity.', 'fr': "Nous introduisons une technique d'augmentation des données basée sur le codage par paires d'octets et un modèle d'attention personnelle de type Bert pour améliorer les performances dans les tâches de compréhension du langage parlé. Nous comparons et évaluons cette méthode avec une gamme de techniques d'augmentation englobant des modèles génératifs tels que les VAE et des techniques d'amélioration des performances telles que le remplacement de synonymes et la rétrotranslation. Nous montrons que notre méthode fonctionne très bien sur les tâches de classification de domaine et d'intention pour un assistant vocal et dans une étude utilisateur axée sur le naturel de l'énoncé et la similitude sémantique.", 'ar': 'نقدم تقنية زيادة البيانات بناءً على تشفير زوج البايت ونموذج الانتباه الذاتي الشبيه بـ BERT لتعزيز الأداء في مهام فهم اللغة المنطوقة. نقوم بمقارنة وتقييم هذه الطريقة مع مجموعة من تقنيات التعزيز التي تشمل النماذج التوليدية مثل VAEs وتقنيات تعزيز الأداء مثل استبدال المرادفات والترجمة الخلفية. نوضح أن طريقتنا تؤدي أداءً قويًا في مهام تصنيف المجال والهدف للمساعد الصوتي وفي دراسة المستخدم التي تركز على طبيعية الكلام والتشابه الدلالي.', 'es': 'Presentamos una técnica de aumento de datos basada en la codificación de pares de bytes y un modelo de autoatención similar al de Bert para mejorar el rendimiento en las tareas de comprensión del lenguaje oral. Comparamos y evaluamos este método con una gama de técnicas de aumento que abarcan modelos generativos como los EAs y técnicas de mejora del rendimiento, como la sustitución de sinónimos y la retrotraducción. Demostramos que nuestro método tiene un gran rendimiento en las tareas de clasificación de dominio e intención para un asistente de voz y en un estudio de usuario centrado en la naturalidad de la expresión y la similitud semántica.', 'pt': 'Introduzimos uma técnica de aumento de dados baseada na codificação de pares de bytes e um modelo de autoatenção semelhante ao BERT para aumentar o desempenho em tarefas de compreensão da linguagem falada. Comparamos e avaliamos esse método com uma variedade de técnicas de aumento que abrangem modelos generativos, como VAEs, e técnicas de aumento de desempenho, como substituição de sinônimos e tradução reversa. Mostramos que nosso método funciona fortemente em tarefas de classificação de domínio e intenção para um assistente de voz e em um estudo de usuário focado na naturalidade da expressão e semelhança semântica.', 'ja': '口語理解タスクのパフォーマンスを向上させるために、バイトペア符号化とBERT様自己注目モデルに基づくデータ拡張技術を導入しました。この方法を、VAEなどの生成モデルや、シノニム置換や逆翻訳などのパフォーマンス向上技術を含む幅広い拡張技術と比較し、評価します。私たちの方法は、音声アシスタントのためのドメインとインテントの分類タスク、および発話の自然さと意味の類似性に焦点を当てたユーザー研究で強力に実行されます。', 'zh': '引入一种字节编码之数,与BERT自关模样,以重口语解务之性。 增术较评,生成模样(若VAE)性升擢(如义词代译)。 展其方于音助之域,意之分,注意于语自然性与语义相似性之用户表现出色。', 'ru': 'Мы внедряем технику увеличения данных, основанную на кодировании пары байтов и BERT-подобной модели самовнимания, чтобы повысить производительность задач понимания разговорного языка. Мы сравниваем и оцениваем этот метод с рядом методов увеличения, охватывающих генеративные модели, такие как VAE и методы повышения производительности, такие как замена синонимов и обратная трансляция. Мы показываем, что наш метод сильно выполняет задачи классификации доменов и намерений для голосового помощника и в пользовательском исследовании, ориентированном на естественность речи и семантическое сходство.', 'hi': 'हम बाइट जोड़ी एन्कोडिंग और बोली जाने वाली भाषा समझने वाले कार्यों पर प्रदर्शन को बढ़ावा देने के लिए एक BERT-जैसे आत्म-ध्यान मॉडल के आधार पर एक डेटा संवर्धन तकनीक पेश करते हैं। हम इस विधि की तुलना और मूल्यांकन वृद्धि तकनीकों की एक श्रृंखला के साथ करते हैं जिसमें वीएई और प्रदर्शन-बढ़ाने वाली तकनीकों जैसे पर्यायवाची प्रतिस्थापन और बैक-ट्रांसलेशन जैसे उत्पादक मॉडल शामिल हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि हमारी विधि एक आवाज सहायक के लिए डोमेन और इरादे वर्गीकरण कार्यों पर दृढ़ता से प्रदर्शन करती है और एक उपयोगकर्ता-अध्ययन में उच्चारण स्वाभाविकता और शब्दार्थ समानता पर केंद्रित है।', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach teicníocht mhéadaithe sonraí atá bunaithe ar ionchódú beart beart agus samhail féin-aird ar nós BERT chun feidhmíocht ar thascanna tuiscint teanga labhartha a threisiú. Déanaimid an modh seo a chur i gcomparáid agus a mheas le raon de theicnící méadaithe a chuimsíonn samhlacha giniúna cosúil le VAEanna agus teicnící chun feidhmíocht a threisiú mar athsholáthar comhchiallach agus cúl-aistriúchán. Léirímid go bhfeidhmíonn ár modh go láidir ar thascanna aicmithe fearainn agus intinne do chúntóir gutha agus i staidéar úsáideora atá dírithe ar nádúrthacht cainte agus cosúlacht shéimeantach.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ დავიყენებთ მონაცემების აგგენტაციის ტექნოგია, რომელიც ბაიტის ორივე კოდინეციის დაბაზიან და BERT-ის თავიდან დაახლოების მოდელი, რომელიც უფრო მეტად გამოყენებ ჩვენ ამ პროცემის შემდგენება და გავამუშაობთ აგენტიკაციის ტექნოგიების დისპეზით, როგორც განვითარებული მოდელები, როგორც VAEs და გამოყენებული ტექნონიები, როგორც სინონიმის შეცვლა და დამ ჩვენ მოჩვენებთ ჩვენი მეთოდი ძალიან გავაკეთება დიომინზე და მინდა კლასიფიკაციის დავაკეთება დლამა asistenტისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვი', 'hu': 'Bevezetünk egy bájtpár kódoláson alapuló adatbővítési technikát és egy BERT-szerű önfigyelmet modellt, amely növeli a teljesítményt a beszélt nyelvértési feladatokban. Ezt a módszert számos nagyítási technikával hasonlítjuk össze és értékeljük, amelyek magukban foglalják a generációs modelleket, mint például a VAE-ket és a teljesítménynövelő technikákat, mint például a szinonimák cseréje és a visszafordítás. Megmutatjuk, hogy módszerünk erősen teljesít domain és szándék osztályozási feladatokat egy hangasszisztens esetében, valamint egy olyan felhasználói tanulmányban, amely a kimondás természetességére és szemantikai hasonlóságára összpontosít.', 'el': 'Εισάγουμε μια τεχνική αύξησης δεδομένων βασισμένη στην κωδικοποίηση ζεύγους Byte και ένα μοντέλο αυτοπροσοχής που μοιάζει με BERT για να ενισχύσει την απόδοση σε εργασίες κατανόησης προφορικής γλώσσας. Συγκρίνουμε και αξιολογούμε αυτή τη μέθοδο με μια σειρά τεχνικών αύξησης που περιλαμβάνουν παραγωγικά μοντέλα όπως και τεχνικές ενίσχυσης της απόδοσης, όπως αντικατάσταση συνώνυμων και μεταγραφή. Δείχνουμε ότι η μέθοδος μας αποδίδει έντονα σε εργασίες ταξινόμησης τομέων και προθέσεων για έναν βοηθό φωνής και σε μια μελέτη χρήστη που επικεντρώνεται στη φυσικότητα της έκφρασης και τη σημασιολογική ομοιότητα.', 'it': "Introduciamo una tecnica di aumento dei dati basata sulla codifica della coppia di byte e un modello di auto-attenzione simile a BERT per aumentare le prestazioni nelle attività di comprensione della lingua parlata. Confrontiamo e valutiamo questo metodo con una gamma di tecniche di aumento che comprendono modelli generativi come VAE e tecniche di miglioramento delle prestazioni come la sostituzione dei sinonimi e la traduzione posteriore. Mostriamo che il nostro metodo svolge un'attività di classificazione del dominio e degli intenti per un assistente vocale e in uno studio utente focalizzato sulla naturalezza dell'espressione e somiglianza semantica.", 'kk': 'Біз байт кодтамасына негізделген деректерді күшейту техникасын және BERT сияқты өзгерту үлгісін, сөйлейтін тілдерді түсіну тапсырмаларын көшейту үшін қолданамыз. Біз бұл әдісті синонимді алмастыру және қайта аудару үлгілерімен бірнеше көпшілік техникаларымен салыстырып салыстырамыз. Біз өзіміздің әдімімізді доменге және дыбыс көмекшісінің шектеу тапсырмаларына және пайдаланушылардың зерттеулерінде көздеген сөздердің натуралдық және semantiкалық ұқсастығына назар', 'lt': 'We introduce a data augmentation technique based on byte pair encoding and a BERT-like self-attention model to boost performance on spoken language understanding tasks.  Palyginame ir vertiname šį metodą su įvairiais didinimo metodais, apimančiais generacinius modelius, pvz., VAE ir veiksmingumo didinimo metodus, pvz., sinonimų pakeitimą ir grįžtamąjį vertimą. We show our method performs strongly on domain and intent classification tasks for a voice assistant and in a user-study focused on utterance naturalness and semantic similarity.', 'mt': 'Aħna nintroduċu teknika ta’ żieda tad-dejta bbażata fuq l-ikkodifikar tal-par ta’ bytes u mudell ta’ awtonomija bħal BERT biex tingħata spinta lill-prestazzjoni fuq kompiti ta’ fehim tal-lingwa mitkellma. We compare and evaluate this method with a range of augmentation techniques encompassing generative models such as VAEs and performance-boosting techniques such as synonym replacement and back-translation.  We show our method performs strongly on domain and intent classification tasks for a voice assistant and in a user-study focused on utterance naturalness and semantic similarity.', 'mk': 'Ние воведуваме техника за зголемување на податоците базирана на кодирање на пар бајти и модел на себе внимание како BERT за зголемување на резултатите на задачите за разбирање на говорниот јазик. Го споредуваме и оценуваме овој метод со голем број техники за зголемување кои вклучуваат генерациски модели како што се ВАЕ и техники за зголемување на резултатите како што се замената на синонимите и преводот назад. Ние го покажуваме нашиот метод силно функционира на задачите за класификација на домени и намери за гласовен асистент и во корисничко-студија фокусирана на изразата природност и семантична сличност.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan teknik peningkatan data berdasarkan pengekodan pasangan bait dan model perhatian diri seperti BERT untuk meningkatkan prestasi pada tugas pemahaman bahasa bercakap. Kami membandingkan dan menilai kaedah ini dengan julat teknik peningkatan yang meliputi model generatif seperti VAE dan teknik peningkatan prestasi seperti penggantian sinonim dan terjemahan balik. We show our method performs strongly on domain and intent classification tasks for a voice assistant and in a user-study focused on utterance naturalness and semantic similarity.', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷയിലെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ബൈറ്റ് ജോട്ട് കോഡിങിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള ഡേറ്റാ കൂട്ടിക്കൊണ്ടുള്ള സാങ്കേതികമായ ഒരു  നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ രീതിയെ പരിഗണിക്കുകയും വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. സിനോനിമ മ മാറ്റം മാറ്റുന്നതും പിന്നീട് പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതും വിഎസ് പോലെ ജന നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d ഒരു ശബ്ദം സഹായിയ്ക്കുവേണ്ടി ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കല്\u200d ജോലികള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതും ഒരു ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ പഠനത്തില്\u200d സ്വ', 'mn': 'Бид байт хоёр кодлог болон BERT шиг өөртөө анхаарлын загварын үндсэн өгөгдлийн нэмэлт технологийг танилцуулдаг. Бид энэ аргыг шинэчлэлтийн орлуулах болон буцаад орлуулах технологиудтай харьцуулж, үнэлдэг. Бид өөрсдийнхөө арга нь холбооны тусламжтайгаар хүчтэй ажилладаг, холбооны тусламжтайгаар, хэрэглэгчийн судалгаанд байгалийн байдал болон semantic төстэйгээр төвлөрсөн ажилладаг.', 'ro': 'Introducem o tehnică de augmentare a datelor bazată pe codificarea perechilor de octeți și un model de auto-atenție asemănător BERT pentru a spori performanța în sarcinile de înțelegere a limbii vorbite. Comparăm și evaluăm această metodă cu o gamă de tehnici de augmentare care cuprind modele generative, cum ar fi VAE și tehnici de creștere a performanței, cum ar fi înlocuirea sinonimelor și traducerea înapoi. Vom arăta că metoda noastră efectuează puternic sarcini de clasificare a domeniului și intenției pentru un asistent vocal și într-un studiu de utilizator axat pe naturalitatea pronunțării și similaritatea semantică.', 'no': 'Vi introduserer ein dataaugmentasjonsteknik basert på byte-par-koding og ein BERT-like selvmerkingsmodul for å styra utviklingar på språk-forståking av oppgåver. Vi samanliknar og evaluerer denne metoden med eit rekkje av augmenteringsteknikk som omfattar generelle modeller som VAEs og teknikk som styrer utviklingar som synonymsbytting og tilbakeomsetjing. Vi viser metoden vårt som utfører sterkt på domenet og gjer oppgåver for klassifikasjon for eit stemmeassistent og i ein brukarstudie fokusert på uttalenaturalitet og semantisk likhet.', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy technikę powiększania danych opartą na kodowaniu par bajtów oraz model samoobserwacyjny BERT, aby zwiększyć wydajność zadań rozumienia języka mówionego. Porównujemy i oceniamy tę metodę z szeregiem technik augmentacyjnych obejmujących modele generatywne, takie jak VAE i techniki zwiększające wydajność, takie jak zastępowanie synonimów i wsteczne tłumaczenie. Pokazujemy, że nasza metoda mocno sprawdza się w zadaniach klasyfikacji domen i intencji dla asystenta głosowego oraz w badaniu użytkownika skupionym na naturalności wypowiedzi i podobieństwie semantycznym.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo tehniku povećanja podataka na osnovu kodiranja bajtskih parova i model samopouzdanja kao BERT-a kako bi povećali izvođenje na zadatkima razumevanja govornih jezika. Uspoređujemo i procjenjujemo ovu metodu sa nizom tehnika povećanja koja uključuje generične modele kao što su VAE i tehnike povećanja učinkovitosti poput zamjene sinonima i prevoda nazad. Pokazujemo našu metodu da se snažno izvršava na domenu i nameru klasifikacije zadataka glasnog asistenta i u studiju korisnika fokusiranoj na prirodnoj i semantičkoj sličnosti govora.', 'si': 'අපි දත්ත විශාලනය විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dතිකාරයක් පෙනුම් කරනවා බායිට් ජෝඩි කෝඩියෝග් එක සහ BERT-වගේ ස්වයංග්\u200dරහයක් අවධාන අපි මේ විධානය සම්පූර්ණ විශේෂ විද්\u200dයාවක් සම්පූර්ණ විද්\u200dයාවක් සම්පූර්ණ විද්\u200dයාවක් වගේ VAE සහ විද්\u200dයාවක් විශේෂ විද්\u200d අපි අපේ විධානය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ඩොමේන් එක්ක සහ අභාවිතයෙක් සහ භාවිතාවක් සහ සාමාන්තික සමාන්\u200dය විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa teknikada kordhiska macluumaadka, taasoo lagu saleysan kooban labada kooban iyo model BERT oo u eg, si loo kordhiyo bandhigyada waxyaabaha lagu barto luuqada. Waxaannu isbarbardhignay oo qiimeynaynaa qaababkan qalabka kordhiska ah oo ku wareegsan tusaale ahaan tusaale ahaan tusaale ahaan qaababka geneeral ee VAEs iyo qalabka boosting a ee bandhigyada sida saynonym bedelka iyo turjumidda dib-u-tarjumidda. Waxaynu muujinnaa qaababkayaga si adag ugu sameynaya deegaanka, waxyaabaha kalena si qasab ah ayaannu u sameynaynaa caawiyaha codka iyo waxbarashada isticmaalayaasha oo ku kalsoonaanta dabiicadda iyo sinnaanta.', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar en dataf철rst채rkningsteknik baserad p책 byte par kodning och en BERT-liknande sj채lvuppm채rksamhetsmodell f철r att 철ka prestandan vid talspr책kighet. Vi j채mf철r och utv채rderar denna metod med en rad olika augmentationstekniker som omfattar generativa modeller som VAE och prestandaf철rb채ttrande tekniker som synonymf철rs채ljning och back-translation. Vi visar att v책r metod presterar starkt p책 dom채n- och avsiktsklassificeringsuppgifter f철r en r철stassistent och i en anv채ndarstudie fokuserad p책 yttrandenaturalitet och semantisk likhet.', 'ta': 'We introduce a data augmentation technique based on byte pair encoding and a BERT-like self-attention model to boost performance on spoken language understanding tasks.  நாம் இந்த முறையை ஒப்பிடுக்க மற்றும் மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் விஏஎஸ் மற்றும் செயல்பாட்டு புதிய தொழில்நுட்பம் மாற்றுதல் மற்றும் பின் மொழிபெயர்ப்ப நாங்கள் எங்கள் முறையை காட்டுகிறோம் களம் மீது வலிமையாக செயல்படுத்துகிறது மற்றும் ஒரு குரல் உதவியாளருக்கு intent பிரிப்பு பணிகளை மற்றும் ஒரு', 'ur': 'ہم ایک ڈیٹا افزایش ٹیکنیک کو معلوم کرتے ہیں جو بائیٹ جوڑ اکنوڈینگ پر بنیاد ہے اور ایک BERT جیسی self-attention موڈل کو بات کی زبان سمجھنے کے کاموں پر فعالیت اضافہ کرنے کے لئے۔ ہم نے اس طریقہ کو ایک طریقہ کے مطابق مطابق اور ارزش دیتے ہیں جنرائیٹ موڈل میں شامل ہوتے ہیں جیسے VAEs اور performance-boosting تکنیک جیسے synonym replacement اور back-translation کے مطابق. ہم اپنے طریقے کو دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایک آواز مددگار کے لئے ڈومین پر مضبوط طریقے سے کام کرتا ہے اور ایک آواز مددگار کے لئے اور ایک کارساز مطالعہ میں بات طبیعی اور سیمانتیک برابری پر تمرکز کیا جاتا ہے.', 'uz': "Biz bilan bir xil kodlash asosida maʼlumot yozib qoʻshish teknologini va BERT-ga oʻxshagan o'xshash modelini o'zgartirish uchun gapiradigan tilni o'rganish vazifalarini oshirish uchun o'zgartirish mumkin. Biz bu usulni kamaytirimiz va qiymatimiz, va va va bir xil tarjima qilish kabi generativ modellarni huddi VAEs kabi qo'shish usullari bilan bir nechta qo'shish tugmalar bilan birlashtiramiz. We show our method performs strongly on domain and intent classification tasks for a voice assistant and in a user-study focused on utterance naturalness and semantic similarity.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một kỹ thuật gia tăng dữ liệu dựa trên mã hóa hai byte pair và một mô hình tự chú ý của BERT để nâng cao khả năng nhận thức ngôn ngữ đã nói. Chúng tôi so sánh và đánh giá phương pháp này với một loạt các kỹ thuật gia tăng bao gồm các mô hình sinh sản như các dị dạng và các kỹ thuật tăng sức mạnh, như đồng nghĩa thay thế và hậu dịch. Chúng tôi cho thấy phương pháp này thực hiện chặt chẽ về phân hạng miền và mục đích cho một trợ lý giọng nói và trong một nghiên cứu người dùng tập trung vào tính chất người nói và nét giống nhau.', 'bg': 'Въвеждаме техника за увеличаване на данните, базирана на кодиране по двойки байтове и модел на самовнимание, подобен на БРТ, за да подобрим ефективността при задачите за разбиране на говоримия език. Сравняваме и оценяваме този метод с набор от техники за увеличаване, обхващащи генеративни модели като АЕС и техники за повишаване на производителността като заместване на синонимите и обратен превод. Показваме, че методът ни изпълнява силно задачи по класификация на домейни и намерения за гласов асистент и в потребителско проучване, фокусирано върху естествеността на изказването и семантичното сходство.', 'nl': "We introduceren een data augmentatie techniek gebaseerd op byte pair codering en een BERT-achtig zelfattentiemodel om de prestaties van gesproken taal te verbeteren. We vergelijken en evalueren deze methode met een scala aan augmentatietechnieken, waaronder generatieve modellen zoals VAE's en prestatiebevorderende technieken zoals synoniemvervanging en back-translation. We laten zien dat onze methode sterk presteert op domein- en intentieclassificatietaken voor een spraakassistent en in een gebruikersstudie gericht op uitspraaknaturaliteit en semantische gelijkenis.", 'da': "Vi introducerer en dataaugmentationsteknik baseret på byte pair kodning og en BERT-lignende selvopmærksomhedsmodel for at øge ydeevnen på talesprogforståelsesopgaver. Vi sammenligner og evaluerer denne metode med en række forstærkningsteknikker, der omfatter generative modeller såsom VAE'er og performance-boosting teknikker såsom synonym erstatning og back-translation. Vi viser, at vores metode udfører stærkt domæne- og intentklassifikationsopgaver for en stemmeassistent og i et brugerstudie fokuseret på ytringsnaturlighed og semantisk lighed.", 'de': 'Wir führen eine Datenerweiterungstechnik basierend auf Byte-Paar-Codierung und ein BERT-ähnliches Selbstaufmerksamkeitsmodell ein, um die Leistung bei gesprochenen Sprachverständnisaufgaben zu steigern. Wir vergleichen und bewerten diese Methode mit einer Reihe von Augmentationstechniken, die generative Modelle wie VAEs und leistungssteigernde Techniken wie Synonymsatz und Rückübersetzung umfassen. Wir zeigen, dass unsere Methode bei Domänen- und Intent-Klassifikationsaufgaben für einen Sprachassistenten und in einer Benutzerstudie mit Fokus auf Äußerungsnatürlichkeit und semantische Ähnlichkeit stark funktioniert.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan teknik peningkatan data berdasarkan kodifikasi pasangan byte dan model perhatian diri seperti BERT untuk meningkatkan prestasi pada tugas pemahaman bahasa berbicara. Kami membandingkan dan mengevaluasi metode ini dengan jangkauan teknik peningkatan yang meliputi model generasi seperti VAE dan teknik peningkatan prestasi seperti penggantian sinonim dan terjemahan belakang. Kami menunjukkan metode kami bekerja dengan kuat pada tugas klasifikasi domain dan tujuan untuk asisten suara dan dalam penelitian pengguna yang fokus pada kebenaran ucapan dan persamaan semantis.', 'ko': '우리는 바이트 인코딩에 기반한 데이터 강화 기술과 버트와 유사한 자기주의 모델을 소개하여 구어 이해 임무의 성능을 향상시켰다.우리는 이러한 방법을 일련의 증강 기술과 비교하고 평가했는데 VAEs 등 생성 모델과 동의어 교체와 번역 등 성능 향상 기술을 포함한다.우리는 음성 조수의 영역과 의도 분류 임무, 그리고 언어의 자연도와 의미의 유사성에 전념한 사용자 연구에서 강력한 성능을 보여 주었다.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo tehniku povećanja podataka temeljenu na kodiranju bajtskih parova i model samopouzdanja kao BERT-a kako bi se povećala učinkovitost na zadatkima razumijevanja govornog jezika. Uspoređujemo i procjenjujemo ovu metodu s nizom tehnika povećanja uključujući generične modele kao što su VAE i tehnike povećanja učinkovitosti poput zamjene sinonima i prevoda natrag. Mi pokazujemo našu metodu snažno izvodi na domenu i namjerno klasifikaciju zadataka glasnog asistenta i u studiju korisnika usredotočenoj na prirodnost govora i semantičku sličnost.', 'af': "Ons introduseer 'n data augmentasie teknike gebaseer op byte paar enkodering en 'n BERT-soos self-aandag model om prestasie op praat taal verstaan opdragte te vergroot. Ons vergelyk en evalueer hierdie metode met 'n reek van vergroot teknike wat genereerbare modele omsluit soos VAEs en performance-boosting teknike soos sinonime vervanging en terugvertaling. Ons wys ons metode sterk uitvoer op domein en doel klassifikasiewerke vir 'n stem assistent en in 'n gebruiker-studie gefokus op uitspraak natuurlikheid en semantiese gelykenis.", 'fa': 'ما یک تکنیک افزایش داده را بر اساس رمزبندی جفت بایت و یک مدل خودتوجه مانند BERT برای افزایش عملکرد روی کارهای درک زبانی صحبت می کنیم. ما این روش را با مجموعه فناوری افزایش که شامل مدل\u200cهای ژنترافی مانند VAEs و فناوری\u200cهای افزایش عملکرد مانند جایگزینش سنونیم و ترجمه پشتی مقایسه می\u200cکنیم و ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم. ما روش خودمون رو نشون ميديم که به سختي روي دومين انجام ميده و براي يه دستيار صدا و توي يه مطالعه ي کاربران تمرکز مي کنن روي کلمات طبيعي و شباهت semantic', 'sw': 'Tunaonyesha teknolojia ya kuongeza taarifa kwa kutumia ujumbe wa kodi mbili na modeli inayofanana na BERT kwa ajili ya kuongeza utendaji katika kazi za kuelewa lugha zinazozungumzwa. Tunawalinganisha na kutathmini mbinu hii na mbinu za kukuza zinazozunguka mifano ya jenerali kama vile VAEs na teknolojia za kutengeneza utendaji kama vile kubadilishwa kwa ushirikiano na tafsiri za nyuma. We show our method performs strongly on domain and intent classification tasks for a voice assistant and in a user-study focused on utterance naturalness and semantic similarity.', 'sq': 'Ne futim një teknikë shtimi të të dhënave bazuar në kodimin e çiftit byte dhe një model vetë-vëmendje si BERT për të rritur performancën në detyrat e kuptimit të gjuhës së folur. Ne e krahasojmë dhe vlerësojmë këtë metodë me një gamë teknikash rritjeje që përfshijnë modele gjenerative të tilla si VAE dhe teknika rritjeje të performancës të tilla si zëvendësimi i sinonimit dhe përkthimi prapa. We show our method performs strongly on domain and intent classification tasks for a voice assistant and in a user-study focused on utterance naturalness and semantic similarity.', 'am': 'በቦታ ሁለት እየኮድ እና BERT-ምሳሌ የራሳቸውን ማስታወቂያ ሞዴል እናሳድጋለን፡፡ ይህንን ሥርዓት እናስተካክላለን እና እንደቪAEs እና የስናኒም ለውጦታ እና የጀርባ ትርጓሜ እንደሆነ አካባቢ ሞላትን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የድምፅ ረዳት እና በተጠቃሚው ትምህርት እና በአካባቢነት እና በተቃውሞ ትምህርት እና የግንኙነት እና የግንኙነትን ትምህርት ላይ እናስማራለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք տվյալների բարձրացման տեխնիկան, որը հիմնված է բայտի զույգ կոդավորման վրա և BER-ի նման ինքնաուշադրության մոդելի վրա, որպեսզի բարձրացնենք արտադրությունը խոսված լեզուների հասկանալու խնդիրների վրա: Մենք համեմատում և գնահատում ենք այս մեթոդը բարձրացման մեթոդների բազմաթիվ, որոնք ներառում են սերունդային մոդելներ, ինչպիսիք են ՎԱԵ-ները և արտադրողականությունը բարձրացող մեթոդները, ինչպիսիք են սինոնիմների փոխարինումը և վերա Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը ուժեղ աշխատում է ձայնային օգնականի դասակարգման խնդիրների վրա և օգտագործողների ուսումնասիրության մեջ, որը կենտրոնացված է արտահայտության բնական և սեմանտիկ նմանության վրա:', 'bn': 'আমরা বাইট জোড়া এনকোডিং এবং বেরেটির মতো আত্মমনোযোগ মডেলের ভিত্তিতে একটি ডাটা যোগাযোগের প্রযুক্তি চিহ্নিত করি যাতে কথা বলা ভাষায় বু আমরা এই পদ্ধতিকে তুলনা করি এবং মূল্যায়ন করি জেনারেটিভ মডেল যেমন ভিএএস এবং প্রদর্শন-বুদ্ধির প্রযুক্তি যেমন সিনোনিয়াম প্রতিস্থাপন এবং পিছন-অনুবাদের অনুবাদে আমরা ডোমেইনের উপর শক্তিশালী করে আমাদের পদ্ধতি দেখাচ্ছি এবং কণ্ঠসহকারী কাজের উদ্দেশ্যে ক্লাসাফিকেশন করে এবং ব্যবহারকারী গবেষণার মধ্যে একটি ব্যবহা', 'tr': 'Biz ba첵t 챌ift k철dlemeleri we BERT 첵aly 철z체ne 체ns beren nusgasyny g체rle첵채n dillerden 챌ykarmak 체챌in barlag 체첵tgetmek 체챌in maglumatlary 첵eti힊dir첵채ris. Biz bu y철ntemi d철redici modelleri, VAEs we etkinlik-g체챌lendirme teknikleri, synonym yerine we arka-terjime edilen 첵aly birle힊tirici tekniklerle kar힊캇la힊t캇r캇p de휓erlendiriyoruz. Biz 철z y철ntemimizi domeny we sesi k철mek챌isi 체챌in be첵leki maksady ta첵첵arlama uzmanlaryny we ullan챌ylar-ara힊dyrmalarymyzda durmu힊 dogru챌ylyk we semantik me흫ze힊liklere 체ns ber첵채ris.', 'ca': "Introduïm una tècnica d'augment de dades basada en codificació de parell de bytes i un model d'auto-atenció semblant a BERT per impulsar el rendiment en tasques de comprensió del llenguatge parlat. Comparem i evaluem aquest mètode amb una gama de tècniques d'augmentació que inclouen models generadors com els EIV i tècniques d'augmentació del rendiment com el reemplaçament de sinònims i la traducció posterior. Mostrem que el nostre mètode actua fortament en tasques de classificació de domini i intenció per a un assistent de veu i en un estudi d'usuari centrat en la naturalesa de l'expressió i la similitud semàntica.", 'cs': 'Představujeme techniku rozšíření dat založenou na kódování bajtových párů a BERT-podobný model sebepozornosti pro zvýšení výkonu úkolů porozumění mluvenému jazyku. Porovnáváme a hodnotíme tuto metodu s řadou augmentačních technik zahrnujících generativní modely, jako jsou VAE, a techniky zvyšující výkon, jako je nahrazení synonymů a zpětný překlad. Ukážeme, že naše metoda výrazně funguje na úlohách klasifikace domén a záměrů hlasového asistenta a v uživatelské studii zaměřené na přirozenost výroku a sémantickou podobnost.', 'et': 'Tutvustame baidipaari kodeerimisel põhinevat andmete suurendamise tehnikat ja BERT-laadset enesetähelepanu mudelit, et suurendada kõneleva keele mõistmise ülesannete jõudlust. Me võrdleme ja hindame seda meetodit mitmesuguste suurendusmeetoditega, mis hõlmavad generatiivseid mudeleid nagu VAE ja jõudlust suurendavaid tehnikaid nagu sünonüümide asendamine ja tagasitõlkimine. Näitame, et meie meetod täidab tugevalt hääleassisti domeeni ja kavatsuse klassifitseerimise ülesandeid ning kasutaja-uuringus, mis keskendub väljendusloomulikkusele ja semantilisele sarnasusele.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme tavuparikoodaukseen perustuvan datan augmentaatiotekniikan ja BERT-tyyppisen itsepalvelumallin, jolla parannetaan puhekielen ymmärtämistä. Vertaamme ja arvioimme tätä menetelmää erilaisiin augmentaatiotekniikoihin, jotka kattavat generatiiviset mallit, kuten VAE ja suorituskykyä parantavat tekniikat, kuten synonyymien korvaaminen ja takaisinkääntäminen. Esitämme menetelmämme toimivan voimakkaasti ääniavustajan domain- ja intent-luokittelutehtävissä sekä ilmaisun luonnollisuuteen ja semanttiseen samankaltaisuuteen keskittyvässä käyttäjätutkimuksessa.', 'az': 'Biz byt çift kodlaması və BERT kimi özü-təhlükəsizlik modeli danışan dil anlama işlərinin performansını artırmaq üçün məlumatları artırmaq teknikini təşkil edirik. Biz bu metodları sinonim əvəzini və geri çeviriş kimi generiki modellərlə birlikdə olan çoxlu artırma teknikləri ilə qarşılaşdırırıq və değerləşdiririk. Biz öz metodumuzu domena və səs asistanının klasifikasiya işləri və istifadəçilərin təhsil edilməsi və semantik similarlığına odaqlanmasını göstəririk.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo tehniku povećanja podataka na osnovu kodiranja bajtskih parova i model a samopouzdanja sličnog BERT-a kako bi poboljšali izvođenje na zadacima razumijevanja govornog jezika. Uspoređujemo i procjenjujemo ovu metodu sa nizom tehnika povećanja uključujući generične modele kao što su VAEs i tehnike povećanja učinkovitosti poput zamjene sinonima i prevoda natrag. Mi pokazujemo našu metodu snažno izvršava na domenu i namjeravamo klasifikaciju zadataka glasnog asistenta i u studiju korisnika fokusiranoj na prirodnoj i semantičkoj sličnosti govora.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nyenggunaké sistem anyar nggawe data sistem sing basa banget karo nggawe barang nggawe barang BERT-seneng pisan-seneng pisan banget nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan. We align and assert this method with a Range of agement teknes comprompAssing generated modes like VVS and output-expanding teknes like sinaunym Replacement and back-translation. We show us method sings strength on domain and goal category tasks for a voice Assistt and in a user-test centered on words naternss and semanti Simlarty.', 'ha': "Tuna ƙara wani taki na ƙaramako da data a kan kodi biyu da shirin BERT-misãlin kansa dõmin ya boost aikin da za'a fahimtar aiki da aka faɗa cikin harshen. Tuna samfani da kuma Muke ƙaddara wannan metode da wasu masu ƙaranci da ke ƙunsa da misãlai masu motsi na dabar-daba, kamar misãlan masu buɗewa da masu bastarwa da sami'a da sami'a-surori. We show our method performs strongly on domain and intent classification tasks for a voice assistant and in a user-study focused on utterance naturalness and semantic similarity.", 'he': 'We introduce a data augmentation technique based on byte pair encoding and a BERT-like self-attention model to boost performance on spoken language understanding tasks.  אנו משוותים והערכים את השיטה הזאת עם מגוון של טכניקות גידול מכילות דוגמנים דולרים כמו VAEs וטכניקות גידול ביצועים כמו תחליף סינונים ותרגום מאחור. אנו מראים שהשיטה שלנו מתבצעת בכוחות על משימות מסווגים בתחום וכוונה עבור עוזר קול ובמחקר משתמש שמוקד על טבעיות ביטוי ובדומה סמנטית.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo tehniko povečanja podatkov, ki temelji na kodiranju bajtnih parov in BERT-u podoben model samopozornosti za izboljšanje učinkovitosti pri opravilih razumevanja govorjenega jezika. To metodo primerjamo in ocenjujemo z različnimi tehnikami povečanja, ki vključujejo generativne modele, kot so VAE in tehnike za povečanje zmogljivosti, kot sta zamenjava sinonimov in nazaj prevajanje. Naša metoda je močno uspešna pri opravilih klasifikacije domenskih in namenov za glasovnega asistenta ter v uporabniški študiji, osredotočeni na naravnost izgovora in semantično podobnost.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་byte་ཕུང་གི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གསལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། We compare and evaluate this method with a range of augmentation techniques encompassing generative models such as VAEs and performance-boosting techniques such as synonym replacement and back-translation. We show our method performs strongly on domain and intent classification tasks for a voice assistant and in a user-study focused on utterance naturalness and semantic similarity.'}
{'en': 'How to Evaluate a Summarizer : Study Design and Statistical Analysis for Manual Linguistic Quality Evaluation', 'ar': 'كيفية تقييم الملخص: تصميم الدراسة والتحليل الإحصائي لتقييم الجودة اللغوية اليدوية', 'pt': 'Como avaliar um resumidor: desenho de estudo e análise estatística para avaliação manual da qualidade linguística', 'fr': "Comment évaluer un synthétiseur\xa0: conception d'étude et analyse statistique pour l'évaluation manuelle de la qualité linguistique", 'es': 'Cómo evaluar un sumarizador: diseño de estudios y análisis estadístico para la evaluación manual de la calidad lingüística', 'zh': '如何评估摘要生成器:手动语言质量计算分析', 'ja': 'サマライザーの評価方法：手動言語品質評価のための研究デザインと統計分析', 'hi': 'एक Summarizer का मूल्यांकन कैसे करें: मैन्युअल भाषाई गुणवत्ता मूल्यांकन के लिए अध्ययन डिजाइन और सांख्यिकीय विश्लेषण', 'ru': 'Как оценить реферат: дизайн исследования и статистический анализ для ручной лингвистической оценки качества', 'ga': 'Conas Achoimre a Mheas: Staidéar ar Dhearadh agus Anailís Staitistiúil le haghaidh Measúnú Cáilíochta Teangeolaíoch de Láimh', 'el': 'Πώς να αξιολογήσετε έναν συνοπτικό: Σχεδιασμός Μελέτης και Στατιστική Ανάλυση για Χειροκίνητη Γλωσσολογική Αξιολόγηση Ποιότητας', 'ka': 'როგორ განსაზღვრება საზოგადომისტიკის განსაზღვრება: მოწმება დიზიონი და სტატისტიკური ანალიზი ხელსაწყოთა ლინგურისტიკური განსაზღვრებას', 'hu': 'Hogyan értékeljük egy összefoglalót: Tanulmánytervezés és statisztikai elemzés a kézi nyelvi minőségértékeléshez', 'kk': 'Тұжырымдамасын қалай оқу: Қолмен лингвистикалық сапатты оқу үшін дизайнды және статистикалық анализ оқу', 'it': 'Come valutare un riassunto: Progettazione dello studio e analisi statistica per la valutazione manuale della qualità linguistica', 'mk': 'Како да се оцени резултат: Студијански дизајн и статистичка анализа за рачна јазичка квалитетна оценка', 'ms': 'Bagaimana menilai Penapis: Rancangan kajian dan Analisi Statistik untuk penilaian Kualiti Bahasa Manual', 'lt': 'Kaip įvertinti santrauką: tyrimo projektas ir statistinė analizė, skirta rankiniam kalbos kokybės vertinimui', 'mt': 'Kif tivvaluta Sommarju: Disinn tal-Istudju u Analiżi Statistika għall-Evalwazzjoni Manwali tal-Kwalità Lingwistika', 'ml': 'ഒരു ചുരുക്കത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് എങ്ങനെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു: കൈകാര്യം ലിങ്ഗിസ്റ്റിക്ക് ഗുണവിശേഷത്തിന്റെ വിവരണ', 'mn': 'Холбооны хэвлэгчийг хэрхэн үнэлэх вэ?', 'ro': 'Cum se evaluează un rezumator: Proiectarea studiului și analiza statistică pentru evaluarea manuală a calității lingvistice', 'no': 'Korleis ein samandrag skal evaluerast: Studer utforming og statistisk analyse for manuelt lingskvalitetevaluering', 'pl': 'Jak ocenić podsumowanie: Projekt studiów i analiza statystyczna dla ręcznej oceny jakości językowej', 'si': 'කොහොමද සංශ්\u200dයාපකය විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්නේ: අධ්\u200dයාපනය විද්\u200dයාපනය සහ සංඛ්\u200dයාපකය විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා විශ්', 'so': 'Sidee loo qiimeyn karo Summar: Waxbara Design and Statistical Analysis for ku saabsan Qiimaha luuqada Manual', 'sr': 'Kako proceniti sažetak: Proučavanje dizajna i statističke analize za procjenu ručne lingwističke kvalitete', 'sv': 'Hur man utvärderar en sammanfattare: Studiedesign och statistisk analys för manuell språklig kvalitetsutvärdering', 'ur': 'کس طرح ایک جماریزر کا ارزش کرنا ہے: مہانول لینگیسٹی کیفیت ارزش کے لئے طراحی اور استیسٹی تحلیل کی تلاش کرنا', 'ta': 'ஒரு சுருக்கியை எப்படி மதிப்பிடு: கைமுறை வரையறை மற்றும் புள்ளிவிவரத்தை ஆய்வு செய்க', 'uz': 'Hisobot', 'vi': 'Làm thế nào để đánh giá một Tóm tắt:', 'da': 'Sådan evaluerer du en resuméer: Studiedesign og statistisk analyse til manuel sproglig kvalitetsevaluering', 'nl': 'Hoe een samenvatter te evalueren: Studieontwerp en statistische analyse voor handmatige taalkundige kwaliteitsevaluatie', 'bg': 'Как да оценим обобщение: Проектиране на проучването и статистически анализ за ръчна лингвистична оценка на качеството', 'hr': 'Kako procijeniti sažetak: Proučavanje dizajna i statističke analize za procjenu ručne lingwističke kvalitete', 'fa': 'چگونه ارزیابی جمع\u200cآوری: تحقیق طراحی و تحلیل آماری برای ارزیابی کیفیت لینکیستیک دستی', 'de': 'Wie man einen Summarizer auswertet: Studiendesign und statistische Analyse zur manuellen linguistischen Qualitätsbewertung', 'id': 'Bagaimana Evaluasi Penapis: Desain Studi dan Analisi Statistik untuk Evaluasi Kualitas Bahasa Manual', 'sw': 'Namna ya Kutathmini Mkutano: Tafiti Design na Uchambuzi wa Takwimu kwa Uthibiti wa Utawala wa Kiasili', 'af': "Hoe na Evalueer 'n Opsomming: Studeer Ontwerping en Statistiese Analisie vir Hand Linguistiese Kwaliteit Evalueer", 'ko': '어떻게 평가 요약: 수공 언어 품질 평가에 대한 연구 설계와 통계 분석', 'am': 'ማጠቃለያ እንዴት እንደሚያስተካክሉ: ለManual Linguistic Quality Evaluation Design and Statistical Analysis', 'hy': 'Ինչպե՞ս գնահատել համառոտագրողը. ուսումնասիրության դիզայնը և վիճակագրական վերլուծությունը ձեռքի լեզվաբանական որակի գնահատման համար', 'tr': 'Häzirki jemgyýetçi nähili çykmalydyr: Eller çykyş kalitesi Taýýarlama Prowasynyň Design and Statistik Analizi', 'bn': 'কিভাবে সামার্মারেজার পরীক্ষা করা হবে: ম্যানুয়াল লিঙ্গিস্টিক মানের পরিসংখ্যান গবেষণা এবং পরিসংখ্যান বিশ্লেষণ', 'bs': 'Kako procijeniti sažetak: Proučavanje dizajna i statističke analize za procjenu ručne lingwističke kvalitete', 'ca': 'How to Evaluate a Summarizer: Study Design and Statistical Analysis for Manual Linguistic Quality Evaluation', 'sq': 'Si të vlerësohet një përmbledhës: Projekti i Studimit dhe Analiza Statistike për vlerësimin manual të cilësisë gjuhësore', 'cs': 'Jak vyhodnotit souhrn: Návrh studií a statistická analýza pro manuální hodnocení lingvistické kvality', 'et': 'Kuidas hinnata kokkuvõtet: uuringu kavandamine ja statistiline analüüs käsitsi keelelise kvaliteedi hindamiseks', 'fi': 'Tiivistelmä: Opintosuunnittelu ja tilastollinen analyysi manuaaliseen kielelliseen laadunarviointiin', 'az': 'Qısqa çəkicisini necə değerləşdirə bilər: Əl Lingüistik Qısqa Gözəltməsi üçün Design və Statistik Analizi', 'ha': 'Yãya Ka ƙayyade wani Jummar: Research design and Statistical Analyze for Candidation of Linguistic Qualities', 'he': 'איך להעריך מסכם: עיצוב למחקר ואנליזה סטטיסטית עבור ערכות איכות לינגלית ידנית', 'sk': 'Kako oceniti povzetek: oblikovanje študije in statistična analiza za ročno vrednotenje kakovosti jezikovnega jezika', 'jv': 'Kijane jewêrung a Cumarzer: Learn design and Statstial Test for Manual Linguist Quality Quality ValActivation', 'bo': 'How to Evaluate a Summarizer: Study Design and Statistical Analysis for Manual Linguistic Quality Evaluation'}
{'en': 'Manual evaluation is essential to judge progress on automatic text summarization. However, we conduct a survey on recent summarization system papers that reveals little agreement on how to perform such evaluation studies. We conduct two evaluation experiments on two aspects of summaries’ linguistic quality (coherence and repetitiveness) to compare Likert-type and ranking annotations and show that best choice of evaluation method can vary from one aspect to another. In our survey, we also find that study parameters such as the overall number of annotators and distribution of annotators to annotation items are often not fully reported and that subsequent statistical analysis ignores grouping factors arising from one annotator judging multiple summaries. Using our evaluation experiments, we show that the total number of annotators can have a strong impact on study power and that current statistical analysis methods can inflate type I error rates up to eight-fold. In addition, we highlight that for the purpose of system comparison the current practice of eliciting multiple judgements per summary leads to less powerful and reliable annotations given a fixed study budget.', 'ar': 'التقييم اليدوي ضروري للحكم على التقدم في التلخيص التلقائي للنص. ومع ذلك ، فإننا نجري دراسة استقصائية حول أوراق نظام التلخيص الأخيرة التي تكشف عن القليل من الاتفاق حول كيفية إجراء دراسات التقييم هذه. نجري تجربتين تقييميتين على جانبين من جوانب الجودة اللغوية للملخصات (الاتساق والتكرار) لمقارنة التعليقات التوضيحية من نوع ليكرت وترتيبها وإظهار أن أفضل اختيار لطريقة التقييم يمكن أن يختلف من جانب إلى آخر. في الاستبيان الذي أجريناه ، وجدنا أيضًا أن معلمات الدراسة مثل العدد الإجمالي للشروح وتوزيع التعليقات التوضيحية على عناصر التعليقات التوضيحية غالبًا ما لا يتم الإبلاغ عنها بشكل كامل وأن التحليل الإحصائي اللاحق يتجاهل عوامل التجميع الناشئة عن أحد المعلقين الذين يحكمون على ملخصات متعددة. باستخدام تجارب التقييم الخاصة بنا ، نوضح أن العدد الإجمالي للمضيفين يمكن أن يكون له تأثير قوي على قوة الدراسة وأن أساليب التحليل الإحصائي الحالية يمكن أن تضخم معدلات الخطأ من النوع الأول حتى ثمانية أضعاف. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نسلط الضوء على أنه لغرض مقارنة النظام ، تؤدي الممارسة الحالية المتمثلة في استنباط أحكام متعددة لكل ملخص إلى تعليقات توضيحية أقل قوة وموثوقية نظرًا لميزانية دراسة ثابتة.', 'fr': "L'évaluation manuelle est essentielle pour évaluer les progrès de la synthèse automatique du texte. Cependant, nous menons une enquête sur les documents récents du système de synthèse qui révèle peu d'accord sur la façon de réaliser de telles études d'évaluation. Nous menons deux expériences d'évaluation sur deux aspects de la qualité linguistique des résumés (cohérence et répétitivité) afin de comparer les annotations de type Likert et de classement et de montrer que le meilleur choix de méthode d'évaluation peut varier d'un aspect à l'autre. Dans notre enquête, nous avons également constaté que les paramètres de l'étude tels que le nombre total d'annotateurs et la distribution des annotateurs aux éléments d'annotation ne sont souvent pas entièrement rapportés et que l'analyse statistique ultérieure ignore les facteurs de regroupement résultant du fait qu'un annotateur juge plusieurs résumés. À l'aide de nos expériences d'évaluation, nous montrons que le nombre total d'annotateurs peut avoir un impact important sur la puissance de l'étude et que les méthodes d'analyse statistique actuelles peuvent multiplier par huit les taux d'erreur de type I. En outre, nous soulignons qu'aux fins de la comparaison des systèmes, la pratique actuelle qui consiste à obtenir des jugements multiples par résumé conduit à des annotations moins puissantes et moins fiables compte tenu d'un budget d'étude fixe.", 'pt': 'A avaliação manual é essencial para avaliar o progresso na sumarização automática de texto. No entanto, realizamos uma pesquisa em documentos recentes do sistema de sumarização que revela pouca concordância sobre como realizar tais estudos de avaliação. Conduzimos dois experimentos de avaliação em dois aspectos da qualidade linguística dos resumos (coerência e repetitividade) para comparar as anotações do tipo Likert e de classificação e mostrar que a melhor escolha do método de avaliação pode variar de um aspecto para outro. Em nossa pesquisa, também descobrimos que os parâmetros do estudo, como o número total de anotadores e a distribuição de anotadores para itens de anotação, muitas vezes não são totalmente relatados e que a análise estatística subsequente ignora fatores de agrupamento decorrentes de um anotador julgando vários resumos. Usando nossos experimentos de avaliação, mostramos que o número total de anotadores pode ter um forte impacto no poder do estudo e que os métodos atuais de análise estatística podem inflar as taxas de erro tipo I em até oito vezes. Além disso, destacamos que, para fins de comparação de sistemas, a prática atual de elicitar vários julgamentos por resumo leva a anotações menos poderosas e confiáveis, dado um orçamento de estudo fixo.', 'es': 'La evaluación manual es esencial para juzgar el progreso en la sumarización automática de textos. Sin embargo, realizamos una encuesta sobre documentos recientes del sistema de resumen que revela poco acuerdo sobre cómo realizar dichos estudios de evaluación. Llevamos a cabo dos experimentos de evaluación sobre dos aspectos de la calidad lingüística de los resúmenes (coherencia y repetitividad) para comparar anotaciones de tipo Likert y de clasificación y demostrar que la mejor elección del método de evaluación puede variar de un aspecto a otro. En nuestra encuesta, también encontramos que los parámetros del estudio, como el número total de anotadores y la distribución de anotadores a los elementos de anotación, a menudo no se informan completamente y que el análisis estadístico posterior ignora los factores de agrupación que surgen de que un anotador juzgue varios resúmenes. Utilizando nuestros experimentos de evaluación, demostramos que el número total de anotadores puede tener un fuerte impacto en el poder del estudio y que los métodos de análisis estadístico actuales pueden aumentar las tasas de error de tipo I hasta ocho veces. Además, destacamos que para el propósito de la comparación de sistemas, la práctica actual de obtener múltiples juicios por resumen conduce a anotaciones menos poderosas y confiables dado un presupuesto de estudio fijo.', 'ja': '自動テキストサマリの進捗状況を判断するには、手動評価が不可欠です。 しかしながら、このような評価研究の実施方法については、ほとんど意見が一致していないことが明らかになった最近のまとめシステムの論文について調査を行っている。 私たちは、まとめの言語品質（一貫性と反復性）の2つの側面について2つの評価実験を行い、リッカート型注釈とランキング注釈を比較し、評価方法の最良の選択がそれぞれの側面によって異なることを示します。 また、当調査では、注釈者の総数や注釈項目への注釈者の分布などの研究パラメータが完全に報告されていないことが多く、その後の統計分析では、複数の要約を判断する1人の注釈者から生じるグループ化要因が無視されていることがわかっている。 私たちの評価実験を使用して、注釈者の総数は研究力に強い影響を及ぼすことができ、現在の統計分析方法はタイプIのエラー率を最大8倍まで膨らませることができることを示しています。 さらに、システム比較の目的で、概要ごとに複数の判断を引き出す現在の慣行は、固定された研究予算を考慮すると、より強力で信頼性の低い注釈につながることを強調します。', 'zh': '手动评估于自文本摘要进展至重。 然近总系统论文,当示以论文,于此评校,殆未达一致意见。 摘要言两端(连贯性与重复性)两质实验,以较Likert注,明其最佳者而异。 于臣等勘中,臣等犹见,诸如注器总数及注释器到注项分布等参数常不尽报,且随后统计分析忽于一注器决数摘要而分朋因之。 用我评实验,见注器之总数,可以大有所染,而时统计分析之法,可以增I刘错误率八倍。 此外,我们强调,为系统较较的,目前的做法是,在定算下,每摘要引多决定会注释的有力和可靠性减。', 'hi': 'मैन्युअल मूल्यांकन स्वचालित पाठ summarization पर प्रगति का न्याय करने के लिए आवश्यक है। हालांकि, हम हाल ही में सारांशीकरण प्रणाली के कागजात पर एक सर्वेक्षण करते हैं जो इस तरह के मूल्यांकन अध्ययन करने के तरीके पर बहुत कम समझौते का खुलासा करता है। हम सारांश की भाषाई गुणवत्ता (सुसंगतता और पुनरावृत्ति) के दो पहलुओं पर दो मूल्यांकन प्रयोगों का संचालन करते हैं ताकि लायकर्ट-प्रकार और रैंकिंग एनोटेशन की तुलना की जा सके और दिखाया जा सके कि मूल्यांकन विधि का सबसे अच्छा विकल्प एक पहलू से दूसरे पहलू में भिन्न हो सकता है। हमारे सर्वेक्षण में, हम यह भी पाते हैं कि एनोटेटर की समग्र संख्या और एनोटेशन आइटम के लिए एनोटेटर के वितरण जैसे अध्ययन पैरामीटर अक्सर पूरी तरह से रिपोर्ट नहीं किए जाते हैं और बाद के सांख्यिकीय विश्लेषण एक एनोटेटर से उत्पन्न होने वाले समूहीकरण कारकों को अनदेखा करते हैं जो कई सारांशों का आकलन करते हैं। हमारे मूल्यांकन प्रयोगों का उपयोग करते हुए, हम दिखाते हैं कि एनोटेटर की कुल संख्या का अध्ययन शक्ति पर एक मजबूत प्रभाव पड़ सकता है और वर्तमान सांख्यिकीय विश्लेषण विधियां आठ गुना तक टाइप I त्रुटि दरों को बढ़ा सकती हैं। इसके अलावा, हम इस बात पर प्रकाश डालते हैं कि सिस्टम की तुलना के उद्देश्य से प्रति सारांश कई निर्णयों को प्राप्त करने का वर्तमान अभ्यास एक निश्चित अध्ययन बजट को देखते हुए कम शक्तिशाली और विश्वसनीय एनोटेशन की ओर जाता है।', 'ru': 'Оценка в ручном режиме имеет важное значение для оценки прогресса в области автоматического обобщения текста. Вместе с тем мы проводим обследование последних документов по системе обобщения, которое выявляет мало согласия в отношении того, как проводить такие оценочные исследования. Мы проводим два оценочных эксперимента по двум аспектам лингвистического качества резюме (согласованность и повторяемость) для сравнения аннотаций типа Likert и ранжирования и показываем, что наилучший выбор метода оценки может варьироваться от одного аспекта к другому. В нашем исследовании мы также обнаружили, что параметры исследования, такие как общее количество аннотаторов и распределение аннотаций по элементам аннотаций, часто не полностью представлены и что последующий статистический анализ игнорирует факторы группировки, возникающие из одного аннотатора, оценивающего несколько резюме. Используя наши оценочные эксперименты, мы показываем, что общее количество аннотаторов может оказывать сильное влияние на мощность исследования и что текущие методы статистического анализа могут раздувать частоту ошибок типа I до восьмикратного увеличения. Кроме того, мы подчеркиваем, что для целей системного сравнения текущая практика получения множественных суждений за резюме приводит к менее мощным и надежным аннотациям при фиксированном исследовательском бюджете.', 'ga': 'Tá meastóireacht láimhe riachtanach chun an dul chun cinn ar achoimriú uathoibríoch téacs a mheas. Mar sin féin, déanaimid suirbhé ar pháipéir chórais achoimrithe le déanaí a léiríonn nach bhfuil mórán comhaontú ann maidir le conas a leithéid de staidéir mheastóireachta a dhéanamh. Déanaimid dhá thurgnamh meastóireachta ar dhá ghné de cháilíocht teanga na n-achoimrí (comhchuibheas agus atrialltacht) chun anótálacha de chineál Likert agus rangú a chur i gcomparáid agus a thaispeánann gur féidir leis an rogha modh measúnaithe is fearr a bheith éagsúil ó ghné amháin go gné eile. Inár suirbhé, feicimid freisin nach dtugtar tuairisc iomlán go minic ar pharaiméadair staidéir amhail líon iomlán na n-anótálaithe agus dáileadh anótálaithe ar mhíreanna anótála agus go dtugann anailís staitistiúil ina dhiaidh sin neamhaird ar fhachtóirí grúpála a eascraíonn as anótaire amháin a thugann breithiúnas ar achoimrí iolracha. Ag baint úsáide as ár dturgnaimh mheastóireachta, léirímid go bhféadfadh tionchar láidir a bheith ag líon iomlán na n-anótálaithe ar chumhacht staidéir agus gur féidir le modhanna anailíse staidrimh reatha rátaí earráide cineál I a insreabhadh suas le hocht n-uaire. Ina theannta sin, tugaimid chun suntais, chun críocha comparáide córais, go mbíonn nótaí nach bhfuil chomh cumhachtach agus chomh hiontaofa mar thoradh ar an gcleachtas reatha maidir le breithiúnais iolracha a fháil in aghaidh an achoimre nuair a thugtar buiséad seasta staidéir.', 'ka': 'პროგრამის შესაბამისი შესაბამისი ტექსტის შესაბამისი პროგრამის შესაბამისათვის მნიშვნელოვანია. მაგრამ, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ ახალი სისტემის კოსტუმენტის კოსტუმენტების შესახებ, რომელიც აღმოჩნდება პატარა შესახებ როგორ გავაკეთება ასეთი განსაზ ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ ორი განსაზღვრებული ექსპერიმენტები, რომელიც ორი განსაზღვრებული ენგუზიტიკური კალენტის (თანდაპირობა და განსაზღვრებულობა) სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვ ჩვენი განსხვავებაში, ჩვენ ასევე ვხედავთ, რომ განსხვავებული პარამეტრები, როგორც ამოტოტორიების უბრალოდ რაოდენობა და ამოტოტორიების გაყოფილი ელემენტების განსხვავებაში, ზოგიერთად არ აღწერება და რომ შემდეგ სტატისტიკური ანალი ჩვენი განსაზღვრებული ექსპერიმენტების გამოყენება, ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ საერთო ანტოტორიების რაოდენობა შეიძლება გააკეთოთ ძალიან ძალიან ექსპერიმენტი სტატისტიკური ანალიზ დამატებით, ჩვენ აღწერეთ, რომ სისტემის მიზეზისთვის მიმდინარე პრაქტიკის გადასწორება მრავალ წესების გადასწორება ერთ წესების შესაძლებლობად უფრო ძალიან და დარწმუნებელ', 'el': 'Η χειρωνακτική αξιολόγηση είναι απαραίτητη για την αξιολόγηση της προόδου στην αυτόματη σύνοψη κειμένου. Ωστόσο, διεξάγουμε μια έρευνα σχετικά με τα πρόσφατα έγγραφα του συστήματος συνοψίας που αποκαλύπτει μικρή συμφωνία σχετικά με τον τρόπο εκτέλεσης τέτοιων μελετών αξιολόγησης. Διεξάγουμε δύο πειράματα αξιολόγησης σε δύο πτυχές της γλωσσικής ποιότητας των περιλήψεων (συνοχή και επαναληπτικότητα) για να συγκρίνουμε σχόλια τύπου και ταξινόμησης και να δείξουμε ότι η καλύτερη επιλογή μεθόδου αξιολόγησης μπορεί να διαφέρει από τη μία πλευρά στην άλλη. Στην έρευνά μας, διαπιστώνουμε επίσης ότι οι παράμετροι μελέτης όπως ο συνολικός αριθμός σχολιαστών και η κατανομή σχολιαστών σε στοιχεία σχολιασμού συχνά δεν αναφέρονται πλήρως και ότι η μεταγενέστερη στατιστική ανάλυση αγνοεί τους παράγοντες ομαδοποίησης που προκύπτουν από έναν σχολιαστή που κρίνει πολλαπλές περιλήψεις. Χρησιμοποιώντας τα πειράματα αξιολόγησης μας, καταδεικνύουμε ότι ο συνολικός αριθμός σχολιαστών μπορεί να έχει ισχυρό αντίκτυπο στη δύναμη μελέτης και ότι οι τρέχουσες μέθοδοι στατιστικής ανάλυσης μπορούν να διογκώσουν τα ποσοστά σφαλμάτων τύπου Ι έως οκτώ φορές. Επιπλέον, επισημαίνουμε ότι για τους σκοπούς της σύγκρισης συστημάτων η τρέχουσα πρακτική της λήψης πολλαπλών κρίσεων ανά περίληψη οδηγεί σε λιγότερο ισχυρές και αξιόπιστες σχολιάσεις με καθορισμένο προϋπολογισμό μελέτης.', 'hu': 'A kézi értékelés alapvető fontosságú az automatikus szövegösszefoglalás terén elért előrehaladás megítéléséhez. Azonban a legutóbbi összefoglaló rendszerű tanulmányokat vizsgáljuk, amelyek alacsony egyetértést mutatnak az ilyen értékelési tanulmányok elvégzéséről. Két értékelési kísérletet végzünk az összefoglalók nyelvi minőségének két aspektusára (koherencia és ismétlődési) vonatkozóan, hogy összehasonlítsuk a Likert típusú és rangsorolási jegyzeteket, és megmutassuk, hogy az értékelési módszer legjobb választása egyik szempontból a másikra változhat. A felmérésünkben azt is megállapítjuk, hogy a tanulmányi paraméterek, mint például a jegyzetelők teljes száma és a jegyzetelők eloszlása a jegyzetelési elemekre gyakran nem kerülnek teljes mértékben jelentésre, és hogy a későbbi statisztikai elemzés figyelmen kívül hagyja az egyetlen jegyzetelőből eredő csoportosítási tényezőket, amelyek több összefoglalót ítélnek meg. Értékelési kísérleteink segítségével megmutatjuk, hogy a kommentátorok teljes száma jelentős hatással lehet a vizsgálati teljesítményre, és hogy a jelenlegi statisztikai elemzési módszerek akár nyolcszorosára is felfújhatják az I. típusú hibaarányt. Emellett kiemeljük, hogy a rendszer összehasonlítása céljából az összefoglalónkénti többszörös ítélet kiváltásának jelenlegi gyakorlata kevésbé hatékony és megbízható megjegyzéseket eredményez fix tanulmányi költségvetéssel.', 'it': "La valutazione manuale è essenziale per valutare i progressi compiuti nella sintesi automatica dei testi. Tuttavia, conduciamo un sondaggio su recenti documenti di sistema di sintesi che rivela poco accordo su come eseguire tali studi di valutazione. Conduciamo due esperimenti di valutazione su due aspetti della qualità linguistica dei riassunti (coerenza e ripetitività) per confrontare le annotazioni di tipo Likert e classifica e dimostrare che la scelta migliore del metodo di valutazione può variare da un aspetto all'altro. Nella nostra indagine, scopriamo anche che i parametri di studio come il numero complessivo di annotatori e la distribuzione degli annotatori agli elementi di annotazione spesso non sono completamente segnalati e che l'analisi statistica successiva ignora i fattori di raggruppamento derivanti da un annotatore che giudica più riassunti. Utilizzando i nostri esperimenti di valutazione, mostriamo che il numero totale di annotatori può avere un forte impatto sul potere di studio e che gli attuali metodi di analisi statistica possono gonfiare i tassi di errore di tipo I fino a otto volte. Inoltre, sottolineiamo che ai fini del confronto dei sistemi l'attuale pratica di emettere giudizi multipli per sintesi porta a annotazioni meno potenti e affidabili dato un budget fisso di studio.", 'kk': 'Автоматты мәтін тұжырымдамасында барысын анықтау үшін қолмен бағалау керек. Бірақ бұл бағалау зерттеулерін қалай жасау жүйесінің жаңа тұжырымдамасы туралы зерттеулерді жасаймыз. Біз екі бағалау тәжірибесін жинақтау тілдік сапасының екі аспекті (тегіс және қайталану) үшін Likert түрін және реттеу жазбаларын салыстырып, бағалау тәжірибесінің ең жақсы таңдау тәжірибесін бір аспектен бір аспе Біздің зерттеулерімізде де, мәліметтерді зерттеу параметрлері мысалы, жазбалардың жалпы саны және жазбалардың үлестіріміздің үлестіріміз көбірек хабарламайды және соңындағы статистикалық анализ бір жазбалардан бірнеше жазбаларды Біздің бағалау тәжірибелерімізді қолданғанда, жалпы жазбалардың саны зерттеу қуатына күшті әсер етеді және қазіргі статистикалық анализ тәсілдері мен түрінің қатенің соғыс ретінде қате жылдамдығын Қосымша, жүйенің мақсатында, бір тұжырымдама бірнеше тұжырымдама тұжырымдамасын салыстыру үшін, бірнеше тұжырымдама тұжырымдамасын салыстыруға күшті және сенімді жазбалар де', 'lt': 'Rankinis vertinimas yra labai svarbus siekiant įvertinti automatinio teksto santraukos pažangą. Tačiau mes atliekame neseniai atliktų santraukų sistemų dokumentų apklausą, kurioje nepakankamai sutariama, kaip atlikti tokius vertinimo tyrimus. Atliekame du vertinimo eksperimentus, susijusius su dviem santraukų kalbinės kokybės aspektais (nuoseklumu ir pakartojimu), siekiant palyginti Likert tipo ir klasifikavimo anotacijas ir parodyti, kad geriausias vertinimo metodo pasirinkimas gali skirtis nuo vieno aspekto prie kito. Mūsų apklausoje taip pat nustatyta, kad tyrimo parametrai, pvz., bendras anotatorių skaičius ir anotatorių paskirstymas anotacijų straipsniams, dažnai nėra išsamiai pranešami ir kad vėlesnė statistinė analizė ignoruoja grupavimo veiksnius, atsirandančius dėl vieno anotatorio, vertinančio kelis santraukas. Using our evaluation experiments, we show that the total number of annotators can have a strong impact on study power and that current statistical analysis methods can inflate type I error rates up to eight-fold.  Be to, pabrėžiame, kad sistemų palyginimo tikslais dabartinė praktika, kai kiekvienoje santraukoje pateikiami keli sprendimai, lemia mažiau galingų ir patikimų pastabų dėl fiksuoto tyrimo biudžeto.', 'mk': 'Рачната евалуација е суштинска за да се процени напредокот во автоматската резултатација на текстот. Сепак, спроведуваме истрага за неодамнешните документи од системот за резултати кои покажуваат мал договор за тоа како да се спроведат вакви проценки. Ние спроведуваме два експерименти за проценка на два аспекти на јазичниот квалитет на резултатите (кохеренција и повторност) за да ги споредиме анатациите на типот Ликерт и рангирањето и да покажеме дека најдобриот избор на метод на проценка може да се разлика од еден аспект до друг. Во нашето истражување, исто така, откриваме дека параметрите на студијата, како што е целокупниот број на анотатори и дистрибуцијата на анотаторите на објектите на анотациите, честопати не се известуваат целосно и дека следната статистичка анализа ги игнорира факторите за групирање кои се појавуваат од еден анотатор кој ги оц Користејќи ги нашите експерименти за проценка, покажуваме дека вкупниот број на анотатори може да има силно влијание врз студиската моќ и дека актуелните методи на статистичка анализа можат да ги инфлацираат стапките на грешки на тип I до осумпати. In addition, we highlight that for the purpose of system comparison the current practice of eliciting multiple judgements per summary leads to less powerful and reliable annotations given a fixed study budget.', 'ms': 'Evaluasi manual adalah penting untuk menilai kemajuan dalam penghuraian teks automatik. Namun, kami melakukan penyelidikan pada kertas sistem penghuraian baru-baru ini yang mengungkapkan sedikit kesepakatan tentang bagaimana untuk melakukan penelitian penilaian seperti itu. Kami melakukan dua eksperimen penilaian pada dua aspek kualiti bahasa ringkasan (ketepatan dan pengulangan) untuk membandingkan jenis Likert dan penilaian peringkat dan menunjukkan bahawa pilihan terbaik kaedah penilaian boleh berbeza dari satu aspek ke lain. Dalam survei kami, kami juga mendapati bahawa parameter kajian seperti bilangan keseluruhan annotator dan distribusi annotator kepada item annotasi sering tidak dilaporkan sepenuhnya dan bahawa analisis statistik berikutnya mengabaikan faktor kumpulan yang muncul dari satu annotator menilai ringkasan berbilang. Menggunakan eksperimen penilaian kami, kami menunjukkan bilangan jumlah pencetak boleh mempunyai kesan yang kuat pada kuasa kajian dan bahawa kaedah analisis statistik semasa boleh meningkatkan kadar ralat jenis I sehingga lapan kali. Selain itu, kami menyatakan bahawa untuk tujuan perbandingan sistem praktek semasa mengakibatkan penilaian berbilang per ringkasan membawa kepada annotasi yang kurang kuat dan boleh dipercayai diberikan anggaran kajian tetap.', 'mt': 'Manual evaluation is essential to judge progress on automatic text summarization.  However, we conduct a survey on recent summarization system papers that reveals little agreement on how to perform such evaluation studies.  Aħna nagħmlu żewġ esperimenti ta’ evalwazzjoni fuq żewġ aspetti tal-kwalità lingwistika tas-sommarji (koerenza u ripetittività) biex tqabblu annotazzjonijiet tat-tip Likert u tal-klassifikazzjoni u nuru li l-aħjar għażla tal-metodu ta’ evalwazzjoni tista’ tvarja minn aspett għal ieħor. Fl-istħarriġ tagħna, sabu wkoll li parametri tal-istudju bħall-għadd globali ta’ annotaturi u d-distribuzzjoni ta’ annotaturi għal oġġetti ta’ annotazzjoni ta’ spiss mhumiex irrappurtati bis-sħiħ u li analiżi statistika sussegwenti tinjora fatturi ta’ raggruppament li jirriżultaw minn annotatur wieħed li jqis sommarji multipli. Using our evaluation experiments, we show that the total number of annotators can have a strong impact on study power and that current statistical analysis methods can inflate type I error rates up to eight-fold.  Barra minn hekk, a ħna tenfasizzaw li għall-finijiet tat-tqabbil tas-sistema, il-prattika attwali li jinħolqu ġudizzji multipli għal kull sommarju twassal għal annotazzjonijiet inqas b’saħħithom u affidabbli meta jingħata baġit fiss għall-istudju.', 'ml': 'സ്വയം ടെക്സ്റ്റ് സംസാരിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പുരോഗതി വിധിക്കുന്നതിന് കൈകാര്യം വിലാസപ്പെടു എന്നാലും, നമ്മള്\u200d അടുത്തുതന്നെ സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം പത്രങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒരു പരിശോധന നടത്തുന്നു. അത് എങ്ങനെയാണ് ഈ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d  നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു പരിശോധന പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു, ഒരുപോലെയുള്ള രീതിയിലേയ്ക്കും പുനരോഗങ്ങളിലേക്കും വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കുന്ന രണ്ട് ഭാഷകളിലേക്കും, രണ്ട് ഭാഷകളി നമ്മുടെ പരിശോധനത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു, പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പാര്\u200dമീറ്റര്\u200d പോലെ മൊത്തം പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നവരുടെ എണ്ണം വിതരണം പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യു നമ്മുടെ പരിശോധന പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു, മൊത്തം പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നവരുടെ സംഖ്യ പഠിപ്പിന്റെ ശക്തിയു കൂടാതെ, സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ നിലവിലുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിനെക്കുറിച്ച് നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്ന ഒരു', 'mn': 'Хоосон дүгнэлт автоматжуулалтын хэвлэлт дээр хөгжлийг шалгахад чухал. Гэвч бид саяхан дүгнэлтийн системийн хуудас дээр судалгаа хийж байдаг. Энэ нь хэрхэн дүгнэлтийн судалгааны тухай бага зөвхөн зөвшөөрөл байдлыг харуулдаг. Бид хэлний хэлний хэлний чанарын хоёр талаар хоёр шалгалтын туршилт хийдэг бөгөөд жинхэнэ хэлбэрээс харьцуулахын тулд жинхэнэ хэлбэрээс харьцуулахын тулд хамгийн сайн шалгалтын аргыг нэг талаас өөрчлөх боломжтой болно. Бидний судалгаанд бид мөн судалгааны параметрлүүдийг харж байгаа юм. Жишээлбэл нэр дэвшүүлэгчдийн нийтлэг тоо, нэр дэвшүүлэгчдийн хуваарилалтын тоо ихэвчлэн бүрэн хэлж чадахгүй, дараагийн статистикийн шинжилгээ нь олон нийтлэг хэмжээсүүдийн нэг нэр Бид үнэлгээний туршилтуудыг ашиглаж, нийт хэмжээний анзаарагчид судалгааны эрх мэдэлд хүчтэй нөлөөлж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна. Одоо байгаа статистикийн шинжилгээний арга нь би төрлийн алдааны хувьд найм дахин их нөлөөлж Үүнээс гадна бид системийн зорилго дээр нэг жишээлбэл олон шүүмжлэгүүдийг харьцуулахын тулд орчин үеийн дасгал нь бага хүчирхэг, итгэлтэй байдлаар судалгааны төсөл өгсөн.', 'pl': 'Ocena ręczna jest niezbędna do oceny postępów w zakresie automatycznego podsumowania tekstu. Przeprowadzamy jednak ankietę na temat ostatnich dokumentów systemu podsumowującego, które pokazują niewiele zgodności co do sposobu przeprowadzania takich badań oceniających. Przeprowadzamy dwa eksperymenty ewaluacyjne na dwóch aspektach jakości językowej streszczeń (spójność i powtarzalność) w celu porównania adnotacji typu Likert i rankingu oraz pokazania, że najlepszy wybór metody oceny może się różnić w zależności od aspektu. W naszym badaniu stwierdziliśmy również, że parametry badania, takie jak ogólna liczba adnotatorów i rozkład adnotatorów do elementów adnotacji, często nie są w pełni raportowane i że późniejsza analiza statystyczna ignoruje czynniki grupowania wynikające z jednego adnotatora oceniającego wiele podsumowań. Korzystając z naszych eksperymentów oceniających, pokazujemy, że całkowita liczba adnotatorów może mieć silny wpływ na moc badania i że obecne metody analizy statystycznej mogą zwiększyć wskaźnik błędów typu I do ośmiokrotnego. Ponadto podkreślamy, że dla celów porównywania systemów obecna praktyka wywoływania wielu wyroków na podsumowanie prowadzi do mniej potężnych i wiarygodnych adnotacji przy ustalonym budżecie badań.', 'ro': 'Evaluarea manuală este esențială pentru a evalua progresele înregistrate în rezumarea automată a textelor. Cu toate acestea, efectuăm un sondaj asupra lucrărilor recente privind sistemul de rezumare care dezvăluie puțin acord cu privire la modul în care se efectuează astfel de studii de evaluare. Realizăm două experimente de evaluare pe două aspecte ale calității lingvistice a rezumatelor (coerență și repetitivitate) pentru a compara adnotările de tip Likert și clasamentul și pentru a arăta că cea mai bună alegere a metodei de evaluare poate varia de la un aspect la altul. În sondajul nostru, observăm, de asemenea, că parametrii studiului, cum ar fi numărul total de adnotatori și distribuția adnotatorilor la elementele de adnotare, adesea nu sunt raportați integral și că analiza statistică ulterioară ignoră factorii de grupare care decurg din un adnotator judecând mai multe rezumate. Folosind experimentele noastre de evaluare, demonstrăm că numărul total de adnotatori poate avea un impact puternic asupra puterii studiului și că metodele actuale de analiză statistică pot umfla ratele de eroare de tip I de până la opt ori. În plus, subliniem că, în scopul comparației sistemelor, practica actuală de a provoca mai multe judecăți pe rezumat duce la adnotări mai puțin puternice și fiabile, având în vedere un buget fix de studiu.', 'so': 'Waxaa muhiim ah in aad ku xukunto horumarinta qoraalka si automatic ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaynu baaritaan warqadaha soo dhowaaday ee nidaamka summarinta, taasoo muuqata heshiis yar oo ku saabsan sida loo sameeyo waxbarashada qiimeynta. Waxaannu sameynaa labo imtixaan qiimeynta oo ku qoran labada dhinac oo ka mid ah qiimaha luuqada ee summirka (isku xirnaanta iyo dib u celinta) si aan u barbarbardhigno dhibaatooyin isku mid ah iyo isku mid ah, waxaana tusnaa in qaababka qiimeynta ugu wanaagsan ay kala duwan yihiin dhinaca kale. Baaritaankeenna waxaynu sidoo kale helaynaa in heerarka waxbarashada, tusaale ahaan tirada caadiga ah iyo kala qaybsada alaabta la macaamiloodo lama ogeysiiyo inta badan, baaritaanka statisticada dabadeedna way jeedaan kooxaha kooxaha ka soo jeeda hal wax ku xukumaya summariyo badan. Isku isticmaalaya imtixaanka qiimeynta, waxaynu tusnaynaa in tirada caadiga ah ay saameyn xoog badan ku yeelan karaan xoogga waxbarashada, iyo in qaababka qiyaasta ah ay saameyn ku yeelan karaan caymiska I waxay u badnaan karaan siddeed jeer. Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaynu ku qoraynaa in nidaamka la barbardhigo hababka joogtada ah oo la barwaaqo xukun kala duduwan dhamaadkeeda waxay leedahay dhibaatooyin ka yar oo adag oo aamin ah oo la siiyo bajejeti waxbarasho oo si adag ah.', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක පාළිච්චි සංවිධානය සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශාලනය කරන්න අ නමුත්, අපි අලුත් සංවිධානය පද්ධති පත්තු ගැන පරීක්ෂණයක් කරනවා, ඒ වගේම අනුවිශ්ලේෂණ පරීක්ෂණය ගැන අපි පරීක්ෂණ දෙකක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා සාමාවිකයේ භාෂාවික වතුර (coherence and refitiveness) දෙකක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා Likert-type හා ranging anntations සහ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ඒ වගේම පෙන්වන අපේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, අපි හොයාගන්නවා ඒ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වගේම ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණය අපේ විශ්ලේෂණ පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අන්තිමත් අන්තිමත් අන්තිමත් අන්තිමත් අන්තිමත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට ඒ වගේම, අපි පද්ධතියේ අදහස් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සම්බන්ධ විද', 'no': 'Manuelt evaluering er nødvendig for å bestemme framgang ved automatisk samansetting av tekst. Men vi gjer eit undersøking om nyleg samanseringssystemepapir som viser liten avtale om korleis å utføra slike evalueringsstudiar. Vi gjer to evalueringseksperimenter på to aspektar av språkkvaliteten til sammendraga for å sammenligne Likert- type og rankeringsnotasjonar og vise at beste valet av evalueringsmetode kan variera frå ein aspekt til ein annan. I undersøkinga vårt finn vi også at studieringsparametrar, slik som det generelle talet av annotatorar og distribusjonen av annotatorar til notasjonselementa, er ofte ikkje fullstendig rapportert, og at etternamn statistiske analyser ignorerer grupperingsfaktorer som oppstår frå ein annotator som sprøyter fleire samandrag. Når vi bruker evalueringseksperimentane våre, viser vi at totalt tal av annotatorar kan ha sterk effekt på studieringsstraum og at gjeldande statistiske analysmetoder kan influsera feilrate i typen I opp til åtte ganger. I tillegg merker vi at for å sammenligne systemet gjeldande praksis for å eligere fleire sprøytebrukar per sammendrag fører til mindre kraftige og betre annotasjonar gjeven eit fast studiebbudsjet.', 'sr': 'Ručna procjena je ključna za suđenje napreda na sažetak automatskog teksta. Međutim, mi vodimo istraživanje o nedavnim papirima o sistemu sažetanja koji pokazuje mali sporazum o tome kako izvršiti takve studije za procjenu. Vodimo dva eksperimenta za procjenu na dva aspekta jezičke kvalitete sažetaka (saslušnost i ponovnost) kako bi usporedili vrste Likerta i oznake i pokazali da se najbolji izbor metode procjene može razlikovati od jednog aspekta na drugo. U našem istraživanju takođe nalazimo da se ispitivanje parametra poput ukupnog broja annotatora i distribucije annotatora na predmete annotacije često ne prijavljuje u potpunosti i da se poslednja statistička analiza ignoriše faktore grupiranja koji se pojavljuju iz jednog annotatora koji osuđuje više sažetaka. Koristeći naše eksperimente za procjenu, pokazujemo da ukupni broj annotatora može imati jaki uticaj na proučavanje struje i da trenutne metode statističke analize mogu inflirati stope greške tipa I do osam puta. Osim toga, naglašavamo da, za svrhu sustava, uspoređujemo trenutnu praksiju izbjegavanja višestrukih sudova po sažetku, vodi do manje moćnih i pouzdanih annotacija s obzirom na određen budžet za studiju.', 'sv': 'Manuell utvärdering är nödvändig för att bedöma framstegen med automatisk textsammanfattning. Vi genomför dock en enkät om nyligen genomförda sammanfattningssystem som avslöjar liten enighet om hur man genomför sådana utvärderingsstudier. Vi genomför två utvärderingsexperiment på två aspekter av sammanfattningens språkliga kvalitet (samstämmighet och repetitivitet) för att jämföra Likert-typ och ranking kommentarer och visa att bästa val av utvärderingsmetod kan variera från en aspekt till en annan. I vår undersökning finner vi också att studieparametrar som det totala antalet kommentatorer och fördelningen av kommentatorer till kommentatorobjekt ofta inte rapporteras fullt ut och att efterföljande statistisk analys ignorerar grupperingsfaktorer som uppstår från en kommentator som bedömer flera sammanfattningar. Med hjälp av våra utvärderingsexperiment visar vi att det totala antalet kommentatorer kan ha en stark inverkan på studiekraften och att nuvarande statistiska analysmetoder kan blåsa upp typ I-felfrekvensen upp till åtta gånger. Dessutom framhåller vi att för systemjämförelse leder den nuvarande praxis att framkalla flera bedömningar per sammanfattning till mindre kraftfulla och tillförlitliga anteckningar med en fast studiebudget.', 'ta': 'தானியங்கி உரை சுருக்குதலில் முன்னேற்றம் தீர்ப்பு செய்ய கைமுறை மதிப்பு முக்கியமானது. ஆனால், நாம் சமீபத்தில் சுருக்கும் அமைப்பு தாக்குகளில் ஒரு ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம் அது எவ்வாறு இந்த ஆய்வு ஆய்வுகளை செய் நாம் சுருக்கத்தின் மொழி தரத்தின் இரண்டு பக்கத்தில் இரண்டு மதிப்பீட்டுகளை செய்கிறோம் ஒப்பிட்ட வகையை மற்றும் மீண்டும் ஒப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் சிறந்த மதிப்ப எங்கள் அறிவிப்புகளின் மொத்த எண்ணிக்கையில் அறிவிப்பாளர் மற்றும் அறிவிப்பாளர்களின் பங்கீட்டு போன்ற முழுமையாக அறிவிக்கப்படவில்லை பின்னர் புள்ளிவிவரக்குறிப்பு  எங்கள் மதிப்பீடு சோதனைகளை பயன்படுத்தி நாங்கள் காண்பிக்கிறோம், மொத்தமான அறிவிப்பாளர்களின் எண்ணிக்கையை படிப்பு சக்தியின் மீது உறுதியான பாதி மேலும், நாம் முறைமையை ஒப்பிடுக்கும் தற்போதைய செயல்பாட்டிற்கு சுருக்கும் பல விதிப்பாடுகளை உயர்த்துவது குறைவாகவும் நம்பிக்', 'ur': 'Manual evaluation is essential to judge progress on automatic text summarization. لیکن ہم نے اچھے سامنے سیستم کاغذوں کے بارے میں ایک تحقیق کیا ہے جو ایسی تحقیق کی تحقیق کیسے کرنا بہت کم موافقت ظاہر کرتا ہے۔ ہم ایک طریقہ سے ایک طریقہ سے مختلف ہو سکتے ہیں۔ ہمارے تحقیقات میں، ہم نے بھی پایا کہ تحقیقات پارامیٹروں کی طرح اظہار کرنے والوں اور اظہار کرنے والوں کی کلی تعداد پوری طور پر گزاری نہیں کی گئی اور اس کے بعد ایستی تحقیقات کی تحقیقات نے ایک اظہار کرنے والے سے ایک اظہار کرنے والوں کی جگہ سے بہت سی جمع فیصلہ کرنے والی گروپ فاکتوروں کو نادانی کر ہمارے ارزیابی آزمائش کے مطابق، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ آٹھ دفعہ تک پہنچا سکتے ہیں کہ آزمائش طاقت پر مضبوط تأثیر حاصل کرسکتے ہیں اور یہ کہ موجود ایسٹیسٹیسٹی تحلیل طریقے میں خطا رات کو آٹھ دفعہ تک اور اس کے علاوہ، ہم نے ہدایت کی کہ سیستم کے ذریعہ سے مقایسہ کرنے کے لئے ایک سرجمع کے چند فیصلے کا مقایسہ کرنے کا موقع مقایسہ کرتا ہے کہ کم طاقتور اور قابل اعتبار کے ذریعہ ایک مضبوط تحقیق بوڈیٹ کے ذریعہ ذریعہ ہے.', 'uz': "@ info Lekin, biz yaqinda qiymatni qanday qilishga qanday qilish haqida qiymatni yaratish haqida juda qiymatni anglatadi. Biz ikkita qiymatni o'rganamiz, qiymatni bir qiymatni bir qiymatga o'rganamiz, ikkita qiymatni o'zgartirib tur va qayta taʼminlovchi qiymatlarga kamaytirish va bir tomondan bir tomondan o'zgartirish mumkin. Bizning qidirimizda o'rganish parametrlarini o'rganamiz, ma'anaviy taʼminlovchi sonlarning ko'p narsalarning ko'plami va taʼminlovchi narsalarning ajratishlarini ko'plab turmaydi va keyingi statistik analytika bir necha qismlarni xususiyatlash uchun guruhlarni guruhlashga eʼtibor bermaydi. Bizning qiymatni tasdiqlash imtiyozlarimizdan foydalanish bilan ko'ramiz, hamma taʼminlovchilar soni o'qituvchi energiga katta ishlatishi mumkin va joriy statistik analytik usullari mening turini 8 marta ko'paytirish mumkin. Ko'pchilik, biz bu tizimning joriy harakatga kamaytirish uchun bir xil xukunalarni ko'paytirish uchun juda ko'plab o'rganish bajarishiga qo'shimcha va ishlatadigan taʼminlovchilarga ega bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Đánh giá bằng thủ công là cần thiết để đánh giá tiến trình tóm tắt văn bản tự động. Tuy nhiên, chúng tôi đang làm một bài kiểm tra về hệ thống tóm tắt gần đây mà tiết lộ ít sự đồng thuận về cách thực hiện các nghiên cứu đánh giá này. Chúng tôi tiến hành hai thí nghiệm đánh giá về hai khía cạnh về chất lượng ngôn ngữ của bản tóm tắt (sự đồng bộ và lặp lại) để so sánh các chú thích kiểu như thích và ghi chú theo thứ hạng và cho thấy lựa chọn tốt nhất của phương pháp đánh giá có thể thay đổi từ khía cạnh này sang hướng khác. Trong cuộc nghiên cứu của chúng ta, chúng ta cũng thấy rằng các tham số nghiên cứu như số lượng tổng thể nhà chú thích và phân phối các chú thích cho các mục chú thích (ghi chú) thường không được báo đầy đủ và các phân tích thống kê tiếp theo không xem các khả năng phân tích nhóm tạo ra từ một chú thích đánh giá các mô- lát. Sử dụng các thí nghiệm đánh giá của chúng tôi, chúng tôi cho thấy rằng số lượng tổng thể nhà chú thích có thể tác động mạnh lên sức mạnh của nghiên cứu và các phương pháp phân tích thống hiện thời có thể thổi phồng tỷ lệ lỗi loại I lên tám lần. Thêm vào đó, chúng tôi nhấn mạnh rằng với mục đích so sánh hệ thống, khả năng gây ra nhiều phán xét nhiều người cho mỗi bản tóm tắt sẽ dẫn đến những ghi chú ít mạnh mẽ và đáng tin cậy khi có một ngân sách nghiên cứu cụ thể.', 'bg': 'Ръчната оценка е от съществено значение за преценката на напредъка при автоматичното обобщаване на текста. Въпреки това, ние провеждаме проучване на последните доклади от системата за обобщаване, което разкрива малко съгласие за това как да се извършват такива проучвания за оценка. Провеждаме два експеримента за оценка на два аспекта на езиковото качество на резюметата (съгласуваност и повтаряемост), за да сравним анотациите тип Ликърт и класиране и да покажем, че най-добрият избор на метод за оценка може да варира от един аспект до друг. В нашето проучване също така откриваме, че параметрите на проучването като общия брой анотатори и разпределението на анотаторите към елементите на анотацията често не се отчитат напълно и че последващият статистически анализ игнорира групиращите фактори, произтичащи от един анотатор, който съди множество резюмета. Използвайки нашите експерименти за оценка, ние показваме, че общият брой анотатори може да има силно въздействие върху силата на проучването и че настоящите методи за статистически анализ могат да надуват процента грешки тип I до осем пъти. В допълнение, подчертаваме, че за целите на системното сравняване сегашната практика за извличане на множество решения на резюме води до по-малко мощни и надеждни анотации при фиксиран бюджет за проучване.', 'nl': 'Handmatige evaluatie is essentieel om de voortgang van automatische tekstsamenvatting te beoordelen. We voeren echter een enquête uit over recente samenvattingssysteemdocumenten waaruit weinig overeenstemming blijkt over hoe dergelijke evaluatiestudies moeten worden uitgevoerd. We voeren twee evaluatieexperimenten uit op twee aspecten van de linguïstische kwaliteit van samenvattingen (coherentie en repetitiviteit) om Likert-type en ranking annotaties te vergelijken en aan te tonen dat de beste keuze van evaluatiemethode van het ene aspect tot het andere kan variëren. In onze enquête vinden we ook dat studieparameters zoals het totale aantal annotatoren en de verdeling van annotatoren naar annotatieitems vaak niet volledig gerapporteerd worden en dat latere statistische analyse groeperingsfactoren negeert die voortvloeien uit één annotator die meerdere samenvattingen beoordeelt. Met behulp van onze evaluatieexperimenten laten we zien dat het totale aantal annotatoren een sterke invloed kan hebben op de studiekracht en dat de huidige statistische analysemethoden type I foutenpercentages tot achtvoudig kunnen opblazen. Daarnaast benadrukken we dat voor de systeemvergelijking de huidige praktijk van het opwekken van meerdere oordelen per samenvatting leidt tot minder krachtige en betrouwbare annotaties bij een vast studiebudget.', 'hr': 'Ručna procjena je ključna za suđenje napredka na sažetku automatskog teksta. Međutim, provodimo istraživanje o nedavnim papirima o sustavu sažetanja koji pokazuju mali sporazum o tome kako izvršiti takve procjene. Provodimo dva eksperimenta za procjenu o dva aspekta jezičke kvalitete sažetaka (saskašnost i ponovnost) kako bi usporedili oznake tipa Likerta i pozornosti i pokazali da se najbolji izbor metode procjene može razlikovati od jednog aspekta na drugo. U našem istraživanju također smatramo da se ispitivanje parametra poput ukupnog broja annotatora i distribucije annotatora često ne prijavljuju u potpunosti i da se nakon toga statistička analiza ignorira faktore skupine koji se pojavljuju iz jednog annotatora koji osuđuje više sažetaka. Koristeći naše eksperimente za procjenu, pokazujemo da ukupni broj annotatora može imati jaki utjecaj na struju ispitivanja i da trenutne metode statističke analize mogu inflirati stope greške tipa I do osam puta. Osim toga, naglašavamo da za cilj sustava uspoređivanje trenutne prakse izbjegavanja višestrukih sudova po sažetku vodi do manje moćnih i pouzdanih annotacija s obzirom na fiksni proračun ispitivanja.', 'da': 'Manuel evaluering er afgørende for at vurdere fremskridtene med automatisk tekstopsummering. Vi gennemfører imidlertid en undersøgelse af nylige opsummeringssystemer papirer, der afslører ringe enighed om, hvordan sådanne evalueringsundersøgelser skal udføres. Vi gennemfører to evalueringseksperimenter på to aspekter af resuméernes sproglige kvalitet (sammenhæng og repetitivitet) for at sammenligne Likert-type og ranking annotationer og vise, at det bedste valg af evalueringsmetode kan variere fra det ene aspekt til det andet. I vores undersøgelse konstaterer vi også, at undersøgelsesparametre såsom det samlede antal kommentatorer og fordelingen af kommentatorer til annotationselementer ofte ikke rapporteres fuldt ud, og at efterfølgende statistisk analyse ignorerer grupperingsfaktorer, der opstår fra en kommentator, der bedømmer flere resuméer. Ved hjælp af vores evalueringseksperimenter viser vi, at det samlede antal kommentatorer kan have en stærk indflydelse på studiestyrken, og at nuværende statistiske analysemetoder kan øge type I fejlfrekvenser op til otte gange. Desuden fremhæver vi, at med henblik på systemsammenligning fører den nuværende praksis med at fremkalde flere domme pr. resumé til mindre effektive og pålidelige noteringer givet et fast studiebudget.', 'fa': 'ارزیابی دستی برای دادن پیشرفت در جمع کردن متن خودکار ضروری است. با این حال، ما یک تحقیق در مورد کاغذ\u200cهای سیستم جمع\u200cآوری اخیر انجام می\u200cدهیم که توافق کوچک را در مورد چگونه انجام این تحقیقات\u200cهای ارزیابی نشان می\u200cدهد. ما دو آزمایش ارزیابی را روی دو قسمت کیفیت زبان جمعیت (هماهنگی و تکرار) برای مقایسه کردن نوع لیکرت و نویسندهای درجه و نشان دهیم که بهترین انتخاب روش ارزیابی می\u200cتواند از یک قسمت به دیگر تغییر دهد. در تحقیقات ما، همچنین پیدا می\u200cکنیم که پارامترهای تحقیقات مثل تعداد کل آهنگ\u200cکننده\u200cها و توزیع آهنگ\u200cکننده\u200cها به عنوان عنوان آهنگ\u200cکننده\u200cها به طور کامل گزارش نمی\u200cشود و آنالیس استاستاریسی بعدی فاکترهای گروه\u200cها را نادیده می\u200cدهد که از یک آهنگ\u200cکننده\u200cای با استفاده از آزمایشات ارزیابی ما، نشان می دهیم که تعداد کل آزمایشگران می تواند تاثیر قوی بر قدرت مطالعه داشته باشد و این روش تحلیل آمار فعلی می تواند نسبت خطای نوع من را تا هشت برابر تأثیر دهد. علاوه بر این، ما تفصیل می کنیم که برای هدف سیستم تمرین فعلی مقایسه کردن تمرین فعلی از تحقیقات چندین قضاوت در تعداد جمعیت به نشانه های قوی و قابل اعتماد کمتر به عنوان یک بودجه تحقیقات ثابت داده شده.', 'de': 'Die manuelle Auswertung ist unerlässlich, um Fortschritte bei der automatischen Textzusammenfassung zu beurteilen. Wir führen jedoch eine Umfrage zu aktuellen Zusammenfassungssystempapieren durch, die wenig Übereinstimmung darüber zeigt, wie solche Evaluationsstudien durchzuführen sind. Wir führen zwei Evaluationsexperimente zu zwei Aspekten der sprachlichen Qualität von Zusammenfassungen (Kohärenz und Repetitivität) durch, um Likert-Typ- und Rangannotationen zu vergleichen und zu zeigen, dass die beste Wahl der Evaluationsmethode von einem Aspekt zum anderen variieren kann. In unserer Umfrage stellen wir außerdem fest, dass Studienparameter wie die Gesamtzahl der Annotatoren und die Verteilung der Annotatoren auf Annotationselemente oft nicht vollständig gemeldet werden und dass nachfolgende statistische Analysen Gruppierungsfaktoren ignorieren, die aus einem Annotator resultieren, der mehrere Zusammenfassungen bewertet. Anhand unserer Evaluationsexperimente zeigen wir, dass die Gesamtzahl der Annotatoren einen starken Einfluss auf die Studienleistung haben kann und dass aktuelle statistische Analysemethoden Typ I Fehlerraten bis zum Achtfachen aufblasen können. Darüber hinaus wird hervorgehoben, dass zum Zwecke des Systemvergleichs die bisherige Praxis der Auslösung mehrerer Urteile pro Zusammenfassung bei einem festen Studienbudget zu weniger leistungsfähigen und zuverlässigen Annotationen führt.', 'id': 'Evaluasi manual adalah penting untuk menilai kemajuan dalam ringkasan teks otomatis. However, we conduct a survey on recent summarization system papers that reveals little agreement on how to perform such evaluation studies.  Kami melakukan dua eksperimen evaluasi pada dua aspek kualitas bahasa ringkasan (koerensi dan ulangan) untuk membandingkan tipe Likert dan anotasi rangkaian dan menunjukkan bahwa pilihan terbaik metode evaluasi dapat berbeda dari satu aspek ke yang lain. Dalam survei kami, kami juga menemukan bahwa parameter studi seperti jumlah keseluruhan annotator dan distribusi annotator pada item annotasi sering tidak dilaporkan sepenuhnya dan bahwa analisis statistik berikutnya mengabaikan faktor grouping yang muncul dari satu annotator menilai beberapa ringkasan. Menggunakan eksperimen evaluasi kami, kami menunjukkan bahwa jumlah total annotator dapat memiliki dampak yang kuat pada kekuatan studi dan bahwa metode analisis statistik saat ini dapat meningkatkan tingkat kesalahan tipe I sampai delapan kali lipat. Selain itu, kami menyatakan bahwa untuk tujuan perbandingan sistem praktek saat ini mengakibatkan banyak penilaian per ringkasan mengarah ke annotasi yang kurang kuat dan dipercaya diberikan anggaran studi tetap.', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa mara kwa mara ni muhimu kuhukumu maendeleo kuhusu muhtasari wa maandishi binafsi. Hata hivyo, tunafanya utafiti kuhusu magazeti ya mfumo wa muhtasari wa hivi karibuni ambayo yanaonyesha makubaliano madogo kuhusu namna ya kutekeleza tafiti hizi za uchunguzi. Tunafanya majaribio mawili ya uchunguzi katika vipande viwili vya muhtasari wa lugha (ushirikiano na upinzani) kulinganisha aina inayofanana na matangazo ya rangi na kuonyesha kwamba njia bora ya uchunguzi unaweza kuwa tofauti na upande mwingine. Katika utafiti wetu, pia tunagundua kuwa tafiti parameters kama vile idadi ya watangazaji na usambazaji wa matangazo kwa vitu vya uchunguzi mara nyingi hautaarifiwa kabisa na kwamba uchambuzi wa takwimu unaofuatia kupuuza makundi yanayotokana na matangazo yanayotokana na mtangazaji mmoja akihukumu muhtasari kadhaa. Kwa kutumia majaribio yetu ya uchunguzi, tunaonyesha kwamba idadi ya watambuzi wa jumla wanaweza kuwa na athari kali juu ya nguvu ya utafiti na kwamba mbinu za uchambuzi wa takwimu za sasa zinaweza kuhamasisha aina yangu ya makosa ya kufikia mara nane. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaonyesha kwamba kwa lengo la mfumo kulinganisha utaratibu wa sasa wa kutafuta maamuzi kadhaa kwa muhtasari unapelekea matatizo ya nguvu na yenye kuaminika kutokana na bajeti moja ya utafiti.', 'ko': '수동 평가는 자동 텍스트 요약의 진도를 판단하는 데 매우 중요하다.그러나 우리는 최근의 요약 시스템 논문을 조사한 결과 이런 평가 연구를 어떻게 하는지에 대해 거의 일치된 의견을 얻지 못했다.우리는 요약된 언어 품질의 두 가지 측면(일관성과 중복성)에 대해 두 차례의 평가 실험을 실시하여 Likert 유형과 순위 주석을 비교하고 평가 방법의 가장 좋은 선택이 서로 다른 측면에 따라 다를 수 있음을 나타냈다.우리의 조사에서 우리는 주석자의 총수와 주석자가 주석 항목에 분포하는 등 연구 파라미터가 충분한 보고를 받지 못했고 그 후의 통계 분석은 한 주석자가 여러 개의 요약을 판단하여 발생하는 그룹 요소를 소홀히 하는 것을 발견했다.우리의 평가 실험을 통해 우리는 주석자의 총수가 학습 능력에 큰 영향을 미치는 것을 발견했고 현재의 통계 분석 방법은 I형 오류율을 8배로 높일 수 있다.그 밖에 우리는 체계적인 비교의 목적을 위해 현재의 방법은 각 총결산에서 여러 가지 판단을 얻어 고정된 연구 예산을 가진 상황에서 주석의 효력과 신뢰성이 비교적 낮다고 강조한다.', 'af': "Hand evaluering is noodsaaklik om vordering te oordeel op outomatiese teks opsomming. Maar ons doen 'n ondersoek oor onlangse opsommingsstelsel papier wat wys klein ooreenkoms oor hoe om sodanige evalueringsstudie te doen. Ons doen twee evalueringseksperimente op twee aspekte van samekoms se lingwisiese kwaliteit (koherens en herhaaldelikheid) om Likert-tipe en rangering notasies te vergelyk en te wys dat die beste keuse van evalueringsmetode kan verander van een aspekt na ander. In ons ondersoek vind ons ook dat ondersoek parameters soos die hele aantal annotators en verspreiding van annotators na annotasie items is dikwels nie volledig rapporteer nie en dat volgende statistiese analisie ignoreer groepfaktore wat uit een annotator oordeel veelvuldige opsommings. Gebruik ons evaluasie eksperimente, wys ons dat die totaal aantal annotators 'n sterk invloek kan hê op studie krag en dat huidige statistiese analisie metodes kan infleer tipe I fout rate tot agt maal. In addition, we highlight that for the purpose of system comparison the current practice of eliciting multiple judgements per summary leads to less powerful and reliable annotations given a fixed study budget.", 'tr': 'Otomatik metin hulaýatynda ögrenişi çözmek üçin elimden çykyş möhüm. Ýöne biz soňky toparlama sistemasy kagytlary hakynda bir soragy çykýarys. Bu ýaly çykyş öwrenmeleri nädip etmelidigini barada kiçi bir ylalaşyk a ýdýar. Biz hulamyň dili kalitesiniň iki aspektinde (hereket we gaýtalançylyk) derejesini çykmak üçin 2 deňlenme experimentalary etdik we çykyş şekliniň iň gowy deňlenme yöntemi bir taraftan başga bir taraftan üýtgedip biler diýip görkezip bileris. Biziň araşdyrymyzda hem araşdyrymyz parametrolary ýaly sözleşici we sözleşici sahypalaryň kop bilen berilmeýän hasaplanyşyň kop berilmeýän hasaplanyşyny tapdyk we soňra statistik analýusynyň bir nusgadan bölegi üýtgetmegini boýun gaýd etýär. Taýýarlama deneylerimizi ullanýarys, toplam ýazgytçylaryň sanynyň çalışma gücüne güýçli täsiri bar we häzirki statistik analýşiň yöntemleri, meniň hatlarymyň hatlarymy sekiz gezek ýokary ýok edip biler. Üstelik, sistemiň maksady üçin häzirki häzirki häzirki häzirki ýüklemek üçin bir topar tarapynda birnäçe häzirki häzirki düzgünleri düşürmek üçin azajyk güçlü we ynamlı duýgulamalara çevrildir.', 'sq': 'Vlerësimi manual është thelbësor për të gjykuar përparimin në përmbledhjen automatike të tekstit. Megjithatë, ne kryejmë një sondazh mbi dokumentet e fundit të sistemit të përmbledhjes që zbulojnë pak marrëveshje mbi mënyrën për të kryer studime të tilla vlerësimi. Ne kryejmë dy eksperimente vlerësimi në dy aspekte të cilësisë gjuhësore të përmbledhjeve (koherencë dhe përsëritje) për të krahasuar anotacionet e tipit Likert dhe renditjen dhe për të treguar se zgjedhja më e mirë e metodës së vlerësimit mund të ndryshojë nga një aspekt në tjetrin. Në sondazhin tonë, gjejmë gjithashtu se parametrat e studimit të tillë si numri i përgjithshëm i anotatorëve dhe shpërndarja e anotatorëve ndaj objekteve të anotacionit shpesh nuk janë raportuar plotësisht dhe se analiza statistike e ardhshme injoron faktorët e grupimit që rrjedhin nga një anotator që gjykon përmbledhje të shumta. Duke përdorur eksperimentet tona të vlerësimit, ne tregojmë se numri i përgjithshëm i anotatorëve mund të ketë një ndikim të fortë në fuqinë e studimit dhe se metodat aktuale të analizës statistike mund të rritin normat e gabimeve të tipit I deri në tetë herë. Përveç kësaj, ne theksojmë se për qëllim të krahasimit të sistemit praktika aktuale e sjelljes së gjykimeve të shumta për përmbledhje çon në anotacione më pak të fuqishme dhe të besueshme duke dhënë një buxhet të caktuar studimi.', 'am': 'በህዳይነቱ ማስታወቂያ የጽሑፍ ማቀናቀል ማግኘት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የቀድሞው የአሁኑን ማስታወቂያ የድምፅ ወረቀቶች ላይ ትንሽ ሽያማግሌ ማድረግ በሚገልጽበት ማኅበረሰብ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የቋንቋው ቋንቋ ጥያቄ (ብሔራዊ እና ማስታወቂያ) ሁለት ጉዳይ ላይ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተመረጠን ውስጥ እንደምታስተምር አካባሪዎችን እና ማስታወቂያውን በሚያሳዩ አካባቢዎች እና አካባሪዎችን ማካፈል ብዙ ጊዜ ሙሉ ሳይዘረጉም እና በኋላው statistical analysis በአንድ አናስታተር ክፍተቶችን ከክፍለ አካባቢ ክፍተቶችን በመፍጠር ይተዋል፡፡ በአመሳሳይ ፈተናዎቻችን በተጠቃሚ፣ ቁጥር በሙሉ አናስታሪዎቹ ላይ የጥላቅ የጥናት ሥልጣን እንዲያገኙ እና አሁን የstatistical analysis ዘዴዎች የስህተት ዓይነት ስምንት እጥፍ እንዲያበዛ ይችላል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የሥርዓት ግንኙነትን ለመተካከል፣ ለሁለተኛው ጉዳይ የብዙ ፍርድ መፍታትን ለማሳየት እና ለመታመን የሚያንስ እና የሚታመነ ግንኙነቶችን ለማሳየት እና ለመጠንቀቂያ ትምህርት ግንኙነት እንዲያሳያል እናስታውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Ձեռքի գնահատումը կարևոր է, որպեսզի դատենք ավտոմատիկ տեքստի համառոտագրման առաջընթացը: Այնուամենայնիվ, մենք հետազոտություն ենք կատարում վերջին համառոտագրման համակարգի փաստաթղթերի մասին, որոնք բացահայտում են քիչ համաձայնություն նման գնահատման ուսումնասիրությունների կատարման մասին: Մենք կատարում ենք երկու գնահատման փորձարկումներ համառոտագրությունների լեզվական որակի երկու ասպեկտների վրա (կատարելականություն և կրկնօրինակություն), որպեսզի համեմատենք Լիկտերի տեսակի և գնահատման նոտացիաները և ցույց տանք, որ գնահատման մեթոդի լավագույն ընտրությունը կարող է Մեր հետազոտության մեջ մենք նաև հայտնաբերեցինք, որ հետազոտության պարամետրերը, ինչպիսիք են annoտորների ընդհանուր քանակը և annoտորների տարածումը annoտացիաների տարրերի վրա, հաճախ ամբողջովին չեն հայտարարվում, և որ հետագա վիճակագրական վերլուծությունը անտեսում է խմբավորումների Օգտագործելով մեր գնահատման փորձարկումները, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ annoտորների համաշխարհային քանակը կարող է ունենալ ուժեղ ազդեցություն ուսումնասիրության ուժի վրա, և որ ներկայիս վիճակագրական վերլուծության մեթոդները կարող են բարձրացնել I-ի տեսակի Ավելին, մենք նշանակում ենք, որ համակարգի համեմատության նպատակով, համառոտագրության բազմաթիվ դատողություններ ստեղծելու ներկայիս գործընթացը հանգեցնում է ավելի քիչ ուժեղ և վստահելի նշումների, որոնք ստացվում են ֆիզիկ ուսումնասի', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে টেক্সট সংক্রান্ত অগ্রগতি বিচার করার জন্য হাতিয়াল মুল্যায়ন গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। তবে আমরা সম্প্রতি সাম্প্রতিক সংক্ষেপ সিস্টেমের কাগজে একটি জরিপ চালু করেছি যা এই ধরনের মূল্যায়ন গবেষণা কিভাবে করা যায় তা  আমরা সংক্ষেপের ভাষার মানের দুই প্রান্তে দুটি মূল্যবোধ পরীক্ষা করি (একত্র এবং পুনরাবৃত্তি) একই ধরনের তুলনা করি এবং রেঙ্কিং বিষয়বস্তুর তুলনা করে দেখাই এবং দেখাই যে ম আমাদের জরিপে আমরা আবিষ্কার করি যে গবেষণার প্যারামিটার যেমন সাধারণত বিভিন্ন সংখ্যার সংখ্যা এবং বিভিন্ন সংখ্যাগুলোর বিভিন্ন সংখ্যাগুলোর বিচারের বিভিন্ন সংখ্ আমাদের মূল্যবান পরীক্ষা ব্যবহার করে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে গবেষণার সংখ্যা গবেষণা ক্ষমতার উপর শক্তিশালী প্রভাব ফেলতে পারে এবং বর্তমান পরিসংখ্যান বিশ্লেষণ পদ এছাড়াও আমরা উল্লেখ করি যে সাম্প্রতিক বিচার বাজেটের বর্তমান প্রক্রিয়ার তুলনায় সিস্টেমের উদ্দেশ্যে তুলনা করা হয়েছে যার ফলে তা কম শক্তিশাল', 'ca': "L'evaluació manual és essencial per a jutjar el progrès en la resumida automàtica del text. Tot i així, fem un estudi sobre els recents documents del sistema de resumes que revelen poc acord sobre com fer aquests estudis d'evaluació. Fem dos experiments d'evaluació en dos aspectes de la qualitat lingüística dels resumes (coherencia i repetitivitat) per comparar anotacions de tipus Likert i de classement i demostrar que la millor elecció del mètode d'evaluació pot variar d'un aspecte a l'altre. En el nostre estudi també trobem que paràmetres d'estudi, com el nombre global d'anotators i la distribució d'anotators a articles d'anotació, sovint no s'informen plenament i que l'anàlisi estadística posterior ignora els factors d'agrupament que surten d'un anotator jugant múltiples resumes. Utilitzant els nostres experiments d'evaluació, demostram que el nombre total d'anotators pot tenir un fort impacte en el poder d'estudi i que els mètodes d'anàlisi estadística actuals poden inflar els índics d'error del tipus I fins a vuit vegades. A més, destaquem que, amb el objectiu de comparar el sistema, la pràctica actual d'obtenir múltiples judicis per resum porta a anotacions menys poderoses i fiables amb un pressupost fixe d'estudi.", 'cs': 'Ruční hodnocení je nezbytné pro posouzení pokroku v automatickém shrnutí textu. Nicméně provádíme průzkum na nedávných dokumentech souhrnného systému, který odhaluje malou shodu o tom, jak takové hodnotící studie provádět. Provádíme dva hodnotící experimenty na dvou aspektech jazykové kvality shrnutí (koherence a opakovatelnost), abychom porovnali Likert-typ a hodnocení anotací a ukázali, že nejlepší výběr hodnotící metody se může lišit z jednoho aspektu k druhému. V našem průzkumu také zjišťujeme, že parametry studie, jako je celkový počet anotátorů a rozdělení anotátorů do anotací položek, nejsou často plně vykazovány a že následná statistická analýza ignoruje skupinové faktory vyplývající z jednoho anotátoru posuzujícího více souhrnů. Pomocí našich hodnotících experimentů ukazujeme, že celkový počet anotátorů může mít silný vliv na studijní sílu a že současné metody statistické analýzy mohou nafouknout chybové míry typu I až osmkrát. Dále zdůrazňujeme, že pro účely systémového srovnání současná praxe vyvolávání více rozsudků na souhrn vede k méně výkonným a spolehlivým anotacím při pevném studijním rozpočtu.', 'az': 'Avtomatik mətn qurğulaması barəsindəki tədbirləri hökm etmək məqsədilə əlli değerlendirmək mövcuddur. Ancaq biz yeni təmizləmə sistemi kağıtları haqqında bir incəstə çəkirik ki, böyük təmizləmə çalışmalarını necə yerinə yetirmək haqqında az bir anlaşma göstərir. İki dəyişiklik dillərin dili kalitetinin (birləşməsi və təkrarlanması) iki dəyişiklik təcrübələrini daşıdırmaq üçün, Likert türünü və dəyişiklik notlarını saldırmaq üçün və təcrübələrin ən yaxşı seçilməsi tərzlərinin bir hissəsindən başqasına dəyişiklik edə biləcəyini göstərdik. Bizim araştırmalarımızda həmçinin araştırma parametrlərini də görürük ki, nöqtəsizlərin bütün nöqtəsi və nöqtəsizlərin dağıtılması kimi təkrar tamamlanmaz və sonra statistik analizi bir nöqtəsizlərin çoxlu nöqtəsizlərin hökmünü verən bir nöqtəsizlərin dəstək faktörlərini görməz. Bizim değerlendirmə təcrübələrimizdən istifadə edirik ki, təcrübə gücünə çox qüvvətli təcrübə edə bilər və həmin statistik analizi metodların mənin səkkiz dəfə qədər xəta hüquqlarını təşkil edə bilər. Əksinə, sistemin məqsədilə, hər dəfə çoxlu hökmləri təhsil etmək üçün müxtəlif təhsil edilməsi üçün daha qüvvətli və güvenilir təhsil budžetına verilən təhsil təhsil edilməsi üçün istifadə edirik.', 'bs': 'Ručna procjena je ključna za suđenje napredka na sažetku automatskog teksta. Međutim, provodimo istraživanje o nedavnim papirima o sistemu sažetanja koji otkrivaju mali sporazum o tome kako izvršiti takve procjene. Vodimo dva eksperimenta za procjenu o dva aspekta jezičke kvalitete sažetaka (saskašnost i ponovnost) kako bi usporedili vrste Likerta i oznake o ocjenu i pokazali da se najbolji izbor metode procjene može razlikovati iz jednog aspekta na drugo. U našem istraživanju također nalazimo da se u potpunosti ne prijavljuju i da se u posljednjoj statističkoj analizi ignorira faktore grupiranja koji se pojavljuju iz jednog annotatora koji osuđuje više sažetaka. Koristeći naše eksperimente za procjenu, pokazujemo da ukupni broj annotatora može imati jaki utjecaj na struju ispitivanja i da trenutne metode statističke analize mogu inflirati stope greške tipa I do osam puta. Osim toga, naglašavamo da za cilj sustava usporedbe trenutne prakse izbjegavanja višestrukih sudova po sažetku vodi do manje moćnih i pouzdanih annotacija s obzirom na fiksni budžet studija.', 'et': 'Manuaalne hindamine on oluline, et hinnata automaatse teksti kokkuvõtliku koostamise edusamme. Siiski korraldame uuringu hiljutiste kokkuvõtlussüsteemi dokumentide kohta, mis näitab vähe kokkulepet selliste hindamisuuringute teostamise kohta. Viime läbi kaks hindamiskatset kokkuvõtete keelelise kvaliteedi kahe aspekti (sidusus ja korduvus), et võrrelda Likerti tüüpi ja järjestuse annotatsioone ning näidata, et parim hindamismeetodi valik võib erineda ühest aspektist teise. Uuringus leiame ka, et uuringu parameetreid, nagu näiteks annotatorite üldarv ja annotatorite jaotumine annotatsiooniüksustele, ei esitata sageli täielikult ning et järgnev statistiline analüüs ignoreerib grupeerimistegureid, mis tulenevad ühest annotatorist, kes hindab mitut kokkuvõtet. Kasutades oma hindamiskatseid, näitame, et annotatorite koguarv võib avaldada tugevat mõju uurimisvõimsusele ja et praegused statistilised analüüsimeetodid võivad suurendada I tüüpi veamäärasid kuni kaheksakordselt. Lisaks rõhutame, et süsteemivõrdluse eesmärgil toob praegune praktika teha mitu otsust kokkuvõtte kohta kaasa vähem võimsad ja usaldusväärsed märkused, arvestades fikseeritud uurimiseelarvet.', 'fi': 'Manuaalinen arviointi on olennaisen tärkeää automaattisen tekstin yhteenvedon edistymisen arvioimiseksi. Toteutamme kuitenkin kyselytutkimuksen viimeaikaisista yhteenvetojärjestelmän papereista, joista käy ilmi, että arviointien suorittamisesta ei ole juurikaan yksimielisyyttä. Teemme kaksi arviointikokeilua tiivistelmien kielellisen laadun kahdesta aspektista (johdonmukaisuus ja toistuvuus) vertaillaksemme Likert- ja ranking-merkintöjä ja osoittaaksemme, että paras arviointimenetelmä voi vaihdella eri näkökulmista. Tutkimuksessamme havaittiin myös, että tutkimuksen parametreja, kuten merkintöjen kokonaismäärää ja merkintöjen jakautumista merkintöjen kohteisiin, ei usein raportoida täysin ja että myöhemmässä tilastollisessa analyysissä ei oteta huomioon yhden selittäjän muodostamia ryhmittelytekijöitä, jotka arvioivat useita yhteenvetoja. Arviointikokeiden avulla osoitamme, että merkintöjen kokonaismäärällä voi olla vahva vaikutus tutkimuksen tehoon ja että nykyiset tilastolliset analyysimenetelmät voivat lisätä tyypin I virhetasoja jopa kahdeksankertaiseksi. Lisäksi korostamme, että järjestelmävertailua varten nykyinen käytäntö tuottaa useita tuomioita yhteenvedossa johtaa vähemmän tehokkaisiin ja luotettaviin huomautuksiin kiinteän opintobudjetin vuoksi.', 'sk': 'Ročno ocenjevanje je bistvenega pomena za oceno napredka pri avtomatičnem povzetku besedila. Vendar pa izvajamo anketo o nedavnih prispevkih sistema povzetkov, ki kaže malo soglasja o tem, kako izvesti takšne ocenjevalne študije. Izvedli smo dva ocenjevalna eksperimenta na dveh vidikih jezikovne kakovosti povzetkov (koherentnost in ponavljajočost), da bi primerjali likertove in razvrščevalne opombe ter pokazali, da se lahko najboljša izbira metode ocenjevanja razlikuje od enega vidika do drugega. V naši raziskavi smo ugotovili tudi, da študijski parametri, kot sta skupno število označevalcev in porazdelitev označevalcev na postavke označevanja, pogosto niso v celoti poročani in da poznejša statistična analiza ignorira dejavnike združevanja, ki izhajajo iz enega označevalca, ki presoja več povzetkov. S pomočjo naših ocenjevalnih poskusov pokažemo, da ima lahko skupno število označevalcev močan vpliv na študijsko moč in da lahko sedanje metode statistične analize povečajo stopnjo napak tipa I do osemkrat. Poleg tega poudarjamo, da za namene primerjave sistemov sedanja praksa izvedbe večkratnih sodb na povzetek vodi do manj močnih in zanesljivih opomb ob fiksnem študijskem proračunu.', 'ha': "Manual evaluation is essential to judge progress on automatic text summarization.  Kayya, ko kuma munã tafiyar wani suriyar a kan takardar ƙararinta na ƙara, da za'a bayyana makubalci kaɗan a kan jinsi za'a iya cika karatun wannan muhalli. Tuna sami jarrabi biyu masu ƙidãya a kan surori biyu masu cikin nau'i'in lugha'ar ƙarshen (kokeci da duffai) kuma muna samfani irin-nau'in da suka yi rangi, kuma Muke nuna cewa zaɓaɓen canza ta canza zaɓa daga guda zuwa guda. Daga tambayarin mu, munã sãmu kamar misãlan ƙidãya na watangare da rabon alararori zuwa abubuwa ba a cika bayan a bayani ba, kuma anaƙatan statistic a bayan, yana ƙẽtare su ga makusanta masu ƙari daga wani mai sanatarwa da ke yin hukunci na ƙarami guda. Yi amfani da jarrabai masu ƙidãya, tuna nuna cewa ƙidãyar matalauta na zartar da mai ƙarfi kan matsayin lõkaci, kuma hanyõyin fasarin da ke kai yanzu, za'a yi amfani da nau'in da ɓata na zuwa sau biyu takwas. In a ƙara, Munã ƙayyade cẽwa, don da amfani da na'ura, yana sami aikin na'ura da yanzu ta cirari masu yawa a juma guda, yana ƙaranci sharuɗe masu ƙarfi da amintacce da aka bai wa budjetarwa tabbatacce.", 'he': 'הערכה ידנית היא חיונית לשפוט התקדמות בקיצור טקסט אוטומטי. However, we conduct a survey on recent summarization system papers that reveals little agreement on how to perform such evaluation studies.  אנו מבצעים שני ניסויים עריכה על שני היבטים של איכות השפה של הסרטים (תואם וחזרות) כדי להשוות ציונים של טיפוס ליקרט ולמערכת הדרגה ולהראות שהבחירה הטובה ביותר של שיטת עריכה יכולה לשתנות מאיזה היבט לאיזה. In our survey, we also find that study parameters such as the overall number of annotators and distribution of annotators to annotation items are often not fully reported and that subsequent statistical analysis ignores grouping factors arising from one annotator judging multiple summaries.  בשימוש בניסויי הערכה שלנו, אנו מראים שהמספר הכולל של המכתבים יכול להיות השפעה חזקה על כוח המחקר ושיטות ניתוח סטטיסטי הנוכחיות יכולות להפיל את שיעורי טעות טיפוס I עד שמונה פעמים. בנוסף, אנו מזכירים כי למטרה להשוות מערכת המעשה הנוכחית של להציג שיפוטים רבים לכל סכם מובילה להציעות פחות חזקות ואמינות בהתחשב בתקציב מחקר קבוע.', 'bo': 'རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཡིག་གི་བཅུད་སྡུད་ཐོག་གི་ཡར་རྒྱས་འགྲོ་བར་གལ་ཆོག་དགོས་པ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཚུལ་གསར་དུ་བཏོན་པའི་རིམ་ལུགས་གནས་ཚུལ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་དེ་རྟོགས་པ་མ་ཟད། ང་ཚོས་མཛུབ་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་མིན་པའི་དབྱེ་བ་གཉིས་ནང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་གོ་སྐབས་ལྟར་ཞིབ་ཕྱོགས་དང་བསྡུར་བརྟན་ན། In our survey, we also find that study parameters such as the overall number of annotators and distribution of annotators to annotation items are often not fully reported and that subsequent statistical analysis ignores grouping factors arising from one annotator judging multiple summaries. ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་བརྟག་ཞིབ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་མ་ལག་གི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག', 'jv': 'Manual politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Awak dhéwé éntuk éntukno dhéwé éntukno éntukno karo haléng péparan ingkang (coherence lan pangalan ingkang) nggawe ngupakan Likert-Tip lan basa rangkeng lan tambah sing berarti tambah nggawe ngubah akeh sing luwih apik dhéwé, iso dianggawe ngubah sampek karo kene. Nanging araha awakdhéwé, kita mulai ngono cah-awakdhéwé éntuk perusahaan karo ngono nggawe layakno sing beraksi ngono nggawe layakno sing beraksi perusahaan liyane gak nggawe lan akeh nyong pada winih dhéwé. Ngawe ngubah nambah éntuk éntuk dadi, kita sembarang seneng pisan anyar tentang gak bukane gak nggawe barang nggawe barang manipulan dadi bisa kelas telas telas telas telas telas. Nambah, awak dhéwé nglanggar nggawe sistem sing berarti dadi pratik sing nggawe gerakan dadi supar sampek dadi kaé bakal terus nggawe nguasai aturan sing luwih apik lan ijolan winih sing entuk dhéwé.'}
{'en': 'Error Analysis and the Role of Morphology', 'es': 'El análisis de errores y el papel de la morfología', 'fr': "L'analyse des erreurs et le rôle de la morphologie", 'ar': 'تحليل الخطأ ودور الصرف', 'pt': 'Análise de Erros e o Papel da Morfologia', 'zh': '差析形态学之用', 'hi': 'त्रुटि विश्लेषण और आकृति विज्ञान की भूमिका', 'ja': '誤差解析と形態学の役割', 'ru': 'Анализ ошибок и роль морфологии', 'ga': 'Anailís Earráide agus Ról na Moirfeolaíochta', 'hu': 'Hibaelemzés és a morfológia szerepe', 'el': 'Ανάλυση σφαλμάτων και ο ρόλος της Μορφολογίας', 'it': 'Analisi degli errori e ruolo della morfologia', 'kk': 'Қате анализ және морфология рөлі', 'mk': 'Анализа на грешки и улогата на морфологијата', 'lt': 'Klaidų analizė ir morfologijos vaidmuo', 'ka': 'შეცდომა ანალიზი და მორფოლოგიის პროლია', 'mt': 'Analiżi ta’ Żbalji u r-Rwol tal-Morfoloġija', 'ml': 'പിശക് അന്വേഷണവും മോര്\u200dഫോളോഗിയുടെ റോളും', 'ms': 'Analisi Ralat dan Perang Morfologi', 'no': 'Feilanalyser og morfologiske rolle', 'pl': 'Analiza błędów i rola morfologii', 'mn': 'Алдаа асуудлын шинжилгээ болон Марфологийн нөлөө', 'si': 'විශ්ලේෂණය සහ මෝර්ෆෝලෝජිකයේ ප්\u200dරදේශය', 'ro': 'Analiza erorilor și rolul morfologiei', 'sr': 'Analiza greške i uloga morfologije', 'so': 'Qalad baaritaanka iyo qaybta Morphology', 'ta': 'பிழை ஆய்வு மற்றும் மார்போலியலின் பங்கு', 'ur': 'غلط تحلیل اور مارفولوژی کی رول', 'sv': 'Felanalys och morfologins roll', 'vi': 'Phim phân tích lỗi và vai trò của Morphology', 'uz': 'Analysi va Morfologning uslubi xatosi', 'nl': 'Foutanalyse en de rol van morfologie', 'da': 'Fejlanalyse og morfologiens rolle', 'hr': 'Analiza greške i uloga morfologije', 'bg': 'Анализ на грешките и ролята на морфологията', 'de': 'Fehleranalyse und die Rolle der Morphologie', 'ko': '오차 분석과 형태학적 역할', 'sw': 'Kukosa uchambuzi na Msingi wa Morphology', 'fa': 'تحلیل خطا و نقش مورفولوژی', 'af': 'Fout Analiseer en die rol van Morphology', 'id': 'Analisi Galat dan Peran Morfologi', 'sq': 'Analiza e gabimeve dhe roli i morfologjisë', 'am': "ፋይል '%s'ን ለማንበብ ስህተት አለ፦ %s", 'tr': 'Marfologiýanyň ýerini analyz we ýüze hata boldy', 'az': 'Q톛ta Analizi v톛 Morphologiyan캼n Ruli', 'bn': 'ত্রুটি বিশ্লেষণ এবং মরোফোলগির রোল', 'bs': 'Analiza greške i uloga morfologije', 'ca': "Anàlisi d'errors i el paper de la morfologia", 'cs': 'Analýza chyb a role morfologie', 'hy': 'Սխալների վերլուծությունը և մորֆոլոգիայի դերը', 'et': 'Vigade analüüs ja morfoloogia roll', 'fi': 'Virheanalyysi ja morfologian rooli', 'he': 'ניתוח שגיאות והתפקיד של מורפולוגיה', 'sk': 'Analiza napak in vloga morfologije', 'ha': 'QXml', 'jv': 'Eror Kanal karo Ngubah Ndeleng Karo Marphologi', 'bo': 'ནོར་འཁྲུལ་གྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དང་སྐོར་བརྒྱུད་ནུས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་ནོར་བ'}
{'en': 'We evaluate two common conjectures in error analysis of NLP models : (i) Morphology is predictive of errors ; and (ii) the importance of morphology increases with the morphological complexity of a language. We show across four different tasks and up to 57 languages that of these conjectures, somewhat surprisingly, only (i) is true. Using morphological features does improve error prediction across tasks ; however, this effect is less pronounced with morphologically complex languages. We speculate this is because morphology is more discriminative in morphologically simple languages. Across all four tasks, case and gender are the morphological features most predictive of error.', 'fr': "Nous évaluons deux conjectures courantes dans l'analyse des erreurs des modèles de PNL\xa0: (i) la morphologie est prédictive des erreurs\xa0; et (ii) l'importance de la morphologie augmente avec la complexité morphologique d'un langage. Nous montrons à travers quatre tâches différentes et jusqu'à 57 langues que de ces conjectures, de manière quelque peu surprenante, seul (i) est vrai. L'utilisation de caractéristiques morphologiques améliore la prédiction des erreurs entre les tâches\xa0; cependant, cet effet est moins prononcé dans les langages morphologiquement complexes. Nous pensons que c'est parce que la morphologie est plus discriminante dans les langages morphologiquement simples. Dans les quatre tâches, le cas et le sexe sont les caractéristiques morphologiques les plus prédictives de l'erreur.", 'es': 'Evaluamos dos conjeturas comunes en el análisis de errores de los modelos de PNL: (i) la morfología es predictiva de errores; y (ii) la importancia de la morfología aumenta con la complejidad morfológica de un idioma. Mostramos a través de cuatro tareas diferentes y hasta 57 idiomas que de estas conjeturas, sorprendentemente, solo (i) es cierta. El uso de características morfológicas mejora la predicción de errores en las tareas; sin embargo, este efecto es menos pronunciado con lenguajes morfológicamente complejos. Especulamos que esto se debe a que la morfología es más discriminativa en lenguajes morfológicamente simples. En las cuatro tareas, el caso y el género son las características morfológicas que más predicen el error.', 'ar': 'نقوم بتقييم تخمينين شائعين في تحليل الخطأ لنماذج البرمجة اللغوية العصبية: (1) علم التشكل هو تنبؤ بالأخطاء ؛ و (2) تزداد أهمية علم التشكل مع التعقيد المورفولوجي للغة. نعرض عبر أربع مهام مختلفة وما يصل إلى 57 لغة تلك التخمينات ، ومن المدهش إلى حد ما أن (i) فقط هو الصحيح. يؤدي استخدام السمات المورفولوجية إلى تحسين التنبؤ بالخطأ عبر المهام ؛ ومع ذلك ، فإن هذا التأثير يكون أقل وضوحًا مع اللغات المعقدة شكليًا. نتوقع أن هذا لأن علم التشكل أكثر تمييزًا في اللغات البسيطة شكليًا. في جميع المهام الأربع ، تعد الحالة والجنس السمات المورفولوجية الأكثر تنبؤًا بالخطأ.', 'pt': 'Avaliamos duas conjecturas comuns na análise de erros de modelos de PNL: (i) a morfologia é preditiva de erros; e (ii) a importância da morfologia aumenta com a complexidade morfológica de uma língua. Mostramos em quatro tarefas diferentes e em até 57 idiomas que dessas conjecturas, surpreendentemente, apenas (i) é verdadeira. O uso de recursos morfológicos melhora a previsão de erros nas tarefas; no entanto, esse efeito é menos pronunciado com línguas morfologicamente complexas. Especulamos que isso ocorre porque a morfologia é mais discriminativa em linguagens morfologicamente simples. Em todas as quatro tarefas, caso e gênero são as características morfológicas mais preditivas de erro.', 'ja': '我々は、NLPモデルの誤差分析における2つの一般的な推測を評価する： （ i ）形態学は誤差を予測する； （ ii ）言語の形態学的複雑性とともに形態学の重要性が増加する。4つの異なるタスクと最大57の言語にわたって、これらの推測のうち、ある程度驚くべきことに、(i)のみが真であることが示されています。形態学的特徴を使用すると、タスク間のエラー予測が改善されますが、この効果は形態学的に複雑な言語ではあまり顕著ではありません。形態論的に単純な言語では形態論の方が差別的だからだと推測しています4つのタスクすべてにわたって、ケースとジェンダーは、エラーを予測する最も重要な形態学的特徴です。', 'zh': '估NLP模形差两常想:(i)形态学可测差; (ii)形态学之要,随言形之复杂性而增之。 四异之务,多至57种语,有所讶者,唯(i)是也。 用形诚可改,用力诚可改。 然其效在形杂语中不太著。 余推其形态学在形态学上简言中更具歧视性。 凡四事者,例性最为占谬。', 'hi': 'हम एनएलपी मॉडल के त्रुटि विश्लेषण में दो सामान्य अनुमानों का मूल्यांकन करते हैं: (i) आकृति विज्ञान त्रुटियों की भविष्यवाणी है; और (ii) आकृति विज्ञान का महत्व किसी भाषा की रूपात्मक जटिलता के साथ बढ़ता है। हम चार अलग-अलग कार्यों में दिखाते हैं और इन अनुमानों में से 57 भाषाओं तक, कुछ हद तक आश्चर्यजनक रूप से, केवल (i) सच है। रूपात्मक सुविधाओं का उपयोग करने से कार्यों में त्रुटि पूर्वानुमान में सुधार होता है; हालांकि, यह प्रभाव रूपात्मक रूप से जटिल भाषाओं के साथ कम स्पष्ट है। हम अनुमान लगाते हैं कि यह इसलिए है क्योंकि रूपात्मक रूप से सरल भाषाओं में आकृति विज्ञान अधिक भेदभावपूर्ण है। सभी चार कार्यों में, मामले और लिंग रूपात्मक विशेषताएं हैं जो त्रुटि की सबसे अधिक भविष्यवाणी करती हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы оцениваем две общие гипотезы при анализе ошибок моделей NLP: (i) морфология предсказывает ошибки; и (ii) важность морфологии возрастает с морфологической сложностью языка. Мы показываем по четырем разным задачам и до 57 языков, что из этих гипотез, несколько удивительно, только (i) верно. Использование морфологических признаков улучшает прогнозирование ошибок между задачами; однако этот эффект менее выражен для морфологически сложных языков. Мы предполагаем, что это потому, что морфология является более дискриминационной в морфологически простых языках. Во всех четырех задачах случай и пол являются морфологическими признаками, наиболее точно предсказывающими ошибку.', 'ga': 'Déanaimid measúnú ar dhá chomhthionól in anailís earráide ar mhúnlaí NLP: (i) Tá moirfeolaíocht réamh-mheasta ar earráidí; agus (ii) méadaíonn an tábhacht a bhaineann le moirfeolaíocht le castacht mhoirfeolaíoch teanga. Léirímid thar cheithre thasc dhifriúla agus suas le 57 teanga nach bhfuil ach (i) fíor de na tuairimí seo, rud nach ionadh. Trí ghnéithe moirfeolaíocha a úsáid, feabhsaíonn sé réamh-mheas earráidí ar fud na dtascanna; áfach, níl an éifeacht seo chomh soiléir le teangacha atá casta ó thaobh moirfeolaíochta de. Tuairimíd é seo toisc go mbíonn an mhoirfeolaíocht níos idirdhealaitheaí i dteangacha atá simplí de réir moirfeolaíochta. Ar fud na gceithre thasc uile, is iad cás agus inscne na gnéithe moirfeolaíocha is réamhaithrisí ar earráid.', 'hu': 'Két gyakori sejtést értékelünk az NLP modellek hibaelemzésében: (i) a morfológia a hibák prediktív; és ii. a morfológia fontossága egy nyelv morfológiai összetettségével növekszik. Négy különböző feladaton és akár 57 nyelven is megmutatjuk, hogy ezek közül a sejtések, kissé meglepő módon, csak (i) igaz. A morfológiai jellemzők használata javítja a hibaelőrejelzést a feladatok között; Ez a hatás azonban kevésbé hangsúlyos a morfológiailag összetett nyelvek esetében. Feltételezzük, hogy ez azért van, mert a morfológia sokkal diszkriminatívabb a morfológiailag egyszerű nyelvekben. Mind a négy feladatban az eset és a nem a legelőrejelzőbb morfológiai jellemzők.', 'el': 'Αξιολογούμε δύο κοινές εικασίες στην ανάλυση σφαλμάτων των μοντέλων: η Μορφολογία είναι πρόβλεψη σφαλμάτων. και η σημασία της μορφολογίας αυξάνεται με τη μορφολογική πολυπλοκότητα μιας γλώσσας. Δείχνουμε σε τέσσερα διαφορετικά καθήκοντα και έως και 57 γλώσσες ότι από αυτές τις εικασίες, κάπως έκπληξη, μόνο (i) είναι αλήθεια. Η χρήση μορφολογικών χαρακτηριστικών βελτιώνει την πρόβλεψη σφαλμάτων σε όλες τις εργασίες. Ωστόσο, η επίδραση αυτή είναι λιγότερο έντονη με μορφολογικά σύνθετες γλώσσες. Υποθέτουμε ότι αυτό οφείλεται στο γεγονός ότι η μορφολογία είναι πιο διακριτική στις μορφολογικά απλές γλώσσες. Σε όλες τις τέσσερις εργασίες, η περίπτωση και το φύλο είναι τα μορφολογικά χαρακτηριστικά που προβλέπουν το λάθος.', 'it': "Valutiamo due congetture comuni nell'analisi degli errori dei modelli NLP: (i) la morfologia è predittiva degli errori; e (ii) l'importanza della morfologia aumenta con la complessità morfologica di una lingua. Mostriamo in quattro diversi compiti e fino a 57 lingue che di queste congetture, sorprendentemente, solo (i) è vero. L'utilizzo di caratteristiche morfologiche migliora la previsione degli errori tra le attività; Tuttavia, questo effetto è meno pronunciato con linguaggi morfologicamente complessi. Ipotizziamo questo perché la morfologia è più discriminatoria nei linguaggi morfologicamente semplici. In tutti e quattro i compiti, caso e genere sono le caratteristiche morfologiche più predittive di errore.", 'lt': 'Vertiname dvi bendras prielaidas atliekant NLP modelių klaidų analizę: i) morfologija numato klaidas; ir ii) morfologijos svarba didėja su morfologiniu kalbos sudėtingumu. Iš keturių skirtingų užduoči ų ir iki 57 kalbų rodome, kad iš šių prielaidų, šiek tiek stebinant, tik i) yra tiesa. Naudojant morfologines savybes pagerinama klaidų prognozė visose užduotyse; tačiau šis poveikis mažesnis morfologiškai sudėtingomis kalbomis. Spekuliuojame, kad morfologija yra labiau diskriminuojanti morfologiškai paprastomis kalbomis. Iš visų keturių užduočių atvejai ir lytis yra labiausiai prognozuojami klaidų morfologiniai požymiai.', 'kk': 'Біз NLP үлгілерінің қателерді анализ үшін екі жалпы ойымызды оқу: i) Морфология қателерді алдын- ала көрсетеді; және ii) морфологияның маңыздығы тілдің морфологиялық комплексілігімен көтереді. Біз төрт әртүрлі тапсырмаларды және 57 тілде тапсырмаларды көрсетедік. Бұл тапсырмалардың бірнеше қызықты, тек i) дұрыс. Морфологиялық мүмкіндіктерді қолдану тапсырмалардың алдындағы қате алдын- ала көрсетеді. Бірақ бұл эффект морфологиялық комплекс тілдермен сөйлесілмейді. Бұл морфология морфологиялық қарапайым тілдерде дискриминациялық. Бүкіл төрт тапсырмалар, үлкен- кішілік және гендер арасындағы морфологиялық мүмкіндіктері қатенің көбірек тапсырмалары.', 'mk': 'We evaluate two common conjectures in error analysis of NLP models: (i) Morphology is predictive of errors;  и ii) важноста на морфологијата се зголемува со морфолошката комплексност на јазикот. Ние покажуваме преку четири различни задачи и до 57 јазици дека од овие претпоставувања, некако изненадувачки, само (i) е вистина. Користењето морфолошки карактеристики го подобрува предвидувањето на грешките низ задачите; сепак, овој ефект е помалку изразен со морфолошки комплексни јазици. Шпекулираме дека ова е затоа што морфологијата е подискриминативна на морфолошки едноставни јазици. На сите четири задачи, случајот и полот се морфолошките карактеристики кои најпредвидуваат грешки.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ NLP მოდელების შეცდომის ანალიზაციაში ორი საერთო კონექტების გავამუშავებთ: და ii) მორფოლოგიის მნიშვნელობა ენის მორფოლოგიური კომპლექსიტებით იქნება. ჩვენ 4 განსხვავებული საქმე და 57 ენაში ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენებთ, რომ ამ კონჯექტურების, რამდენიმე საშუალოდ, მხოლოდ i) მართლაა. მორპოლოგიური ფუნქციების გამოყენება შეცდომის წარმოდგენების გასაკეთება; მაგრამ ეს ეფექტი მოპოროლოგიურად კომპლექსიკურად გამოყენებულია. ჩვენ ამას სპექციულებთ, რადგან მორფოლოგია უფრო დისკრიმინატიურია მორფოლოგიურად ადგილი ენაში. გჟთფკთ ფვრთპთ პაბჲრთ, ჟლსფაი თ ეზვნეყპ ჟა მჲპტჲლჲდთფნთრვ ჲფთნთ, კჲთრჲ ნაი-ოპვეგთევრვლნთ ჲრ დპვქკარა.', 'ml': 'NLP മോഡലുകളുടെ തെറ്റായ അന്വേഷണത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു സാധാരണ ഊഹികങ്ങളെ വിലയിക്കുന്നു: (i) മോര്\u200dഫോളജി തെറ്റുകളുടെ  (ii) മോര്\u200dഫോളജിയുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടത് ഒരു ഭാഷയുടെ മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d സംശയത്തോടൊപ്പം വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കും. നമ്മള്\u200d നാലു വ്യത്യസ്ത ജോലികളിലേക്ക് കാണിക്കുന്നു. 57 ഭാഷകളിലേക്ക് മുഴുവന്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. ഈ ഊഹികളില മോര്\u200dഫോളിക്കല്\u200d ഗുണഗണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ജോലികളില്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d പ്രവചനം മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതി എന്നാലും ഈ പ്രഭാവം മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ഭാഷകളുമായി പ്രസ്താവിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d കുറച നമ്മള്\u200d ഊഹിക്കുന്നത് ഇത് കൊണ്ടാണെന്നാണ് കാരണം മോര്\u200dഫോളജി സാധാരണ ഭാഷകളില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായത്. എല്ലാ നാല് ജോലികള്\u200dക്കും കേസും പെണ്\u200dകുട്ടികള്\u200dക്കും കൂടുതല്\u200d തെറ്റുകളുടെ ഏറ്റവും പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ടതാണ്.', 'mn': 'Бид NLP загварын алдааны шинжилгээнд хоёр ерөнхий тодорхойлолтуудыг үнэлдэг: ii) хэлний морфологикийн төвөгтэй байдлын чухал нь нэмэгддэг. Бид 4 өөр ажил, 57 хэл хүртэл эдгээр тодорхойлолтуудыг харуулж байна. Ямар ч гайхалтай, зөвхөн i нь үнэн. Морфологик чанарыг ашиглах нь буруу таамаглалтыг дамжуулан сайжруулдаг. Гэхдээ энэ нөлөө морфологийн төвөгтэй хэл дээр бага хэмжээтэй. Бид үүнийг тодорхойлж байна, учир нь морфологи нь морфологийн энгийн хэлд илүү ялгаатай. Бүх 4 даалгавар, жишээ, гендер нь алдааны хамгийн тодорхойлолтой морфологик чанар юм.', 'ms': 'Kami menilai dua tekaan umum dalam analisis ralat model NLP: (i) Morfologi adalah ramalan ralat; dan (ii) kepentingan morfologi meningkat dengan kompleksiti morfologi bahasa. Kami menunjukkan pada empat tugas yang berbeza dan sehingga 57 bahasa bahasa yang dari tekaan ini, agak mengejutkan, hanya (i) benar. Using morphological features does improve error prediction across tasks;  bagaimanapun, kesan ini kurang diungkapkan dengan bahasa morfologik kompleks. Kami mengira ini kerana morfologi lebih diskriminatif dalam bahasa yang mudah secara morfologik. Melalui empat tugas, kes dan jenis adalah ciri-ciri morfologi yang paling meramalkan ralat.', 'mt': 'We evaluate two common conjectures in error analysis of NLP models: (i) Morphology is predictive of errors;  u (ii) l-importanza tal-morfoloġija tiżdied bil-kumplessità morfoloġika ta’ lingwa. Aħna nuru f’erba’ kompiti different i u sa 57 lingwa li minn dawn il-kunjetti, b’mod xi ħaġa sorprendenti, huwa biss (i) veru. L-użu ta’ karatteristiċi morfoloġiċi jtejjeb it-tbassir tal-iżbalji fost il-kompiti; madankollu, dan l-effett huwa inqas evidenti b’lingwi morfoloġikament kumplessi. Nispekulaw dan minħabba li l-morfoloġija hija aktar diskriminatorja f’lingwi morfoloġikament sempliċi. Fl-erba’ kompiti kollha, il-każ u s-sess huma l-karatteristiċi morfoloġiċi l-aktar prevedibbli ta’ żball.', 'no': 'Vi evaluerer to vanlege verknader i feilanalysen av NLP-modeller: i) Morfologi er forhåndsvising av feil. og ii) viktigheten til morfologi øker med morfologiske kompleksitet av eit språk. Vi viser over fire forskjellige oppgåver og opp til 57 språk at av desse oppgåvene er litt overraska, bare i er sann. Bruk morfologiske funksjonar forbedrar feilforhåndsvising over oppgåver. Dette effekten er imidlertid mindre uttalet med morfologisk komplekse språk. Vi spesifiserer dette er fordi morfologien er meir diskriminasjon i morfologisk enkle språk. På alle fire oppgåver, store og kvelder er dei morfologiske funksjonane som er mest foregåande av feil.', 'pl': 'Oceniamy dwa powszechne przypuszczenia w analizie błędów modeli NLP: (i) Morfologia jest predykcyjna błędów; oraz (ii) znaczenie morfologii wzrasta wraz ze złożonością morfologiczną języka. Pokazujemy w czterech różnych zadaniach i do 57-języków, że z tych domyśleń, nieco zaskakująco, tylko (i) jest prawdą. Korzystanie z cech morfologicznych poprawia przewidywanie błędów w różnych zadaniach; Jednak efekt ten jest mniej wyraźny w przypadku języków złożonych morfologicznie. Spekulujemy, że jest to dlatego, że morfologia jest bardziej dyskryminująca w morfologicznie prostych językach. We wszystkich czterech zadaniach, przypadek i płeć są najbardziej predykcyjnymi cechami morfologicznymi błędu.', 'ro': 'Evaluăm două presupuneri comune în analiza erorilor modelelor PNL: (i) Morfologia este predictivă a erorilor; şi (ii) importanţa morfologiei creşte odată cu complexitatea morfologică a unei limbi. Aratăm în patru sarcini diferite și până la 57 de limbi că dintre aceste presupuneri, oarecum surprinzător, numai (i) este adevărat. Utilizarea caracteristicilor morfologice îmbunătățește predicția erorilor între sarcini; Cu toate acestea, acest efect este mai puțin pronunțat în cazul limbajelor morfologic complexe. Speculăm că acest lucru se datorează faptului că morfologia este mai discriminatorie în limbile morfologic simple. În toate cele patru sarcini, cazul și sexul sunt caracteristicile morfologice cele mai predictive de eroare.', 'sr': 'Procjenjujemo dve zajedničke pretpostavke u analizi greške modela NLP: i) Morfologija predviđa greške; i ii) važnost morfologije povećava sa morfološkom kompleksnošću jezika. Mi pokazujemo na četiri različite zadatke i do 57 jezika da je od ovih pretpostavki malo iznenađujuće, samo i) istina. Koristenje morfoloških karakteristika poboljšava predviđanje grešaka preko zadataka; međutim, ovaj efekat je manje proglašen morfološki kompleksnim jezicima. Pretpostavljamo da je to zato što je morfologija diskriminacija morfološki jednostavnijim jezicima. Preko svih četiri zadatka, slučaj i spol su morfološke karakteristike koje su najpredvidljivije od greške.', 'sv': 'Vi utvärderar två vanliga antaganden vid felanalys av NLP-modeller: (i) Morfologin är prediktiv för fel; och ii) morfologins betydelse ökar med språkets morfologiska komplexitet. Vi visar över fyra olika uppgifter och upp till 57 språk att av dessa antaganden, något överraskande, endast (i) är sant. Genom att använda morfologiska egenskaper förbättras felförutsägelsen mellan olika uppgifter. Denna effekt är dock mindre uttalad med morfologiskt komplexa språk. Vi spekulerar på att morfologin är mer diskriminerande i morfologiskt enkla språk. Inom alla fyra uppgifterna är fall och kön de morfologiska egenskaperna som är mest prediktiva för fel.', 'si': 'අපි NLP මෝඩල් විශ්ලේෂණයේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණ දෙකක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා: (i) මෝර්ෆෝලෝජියා වැරදි ඒ වගේම (2) භාෂාවේ විශේෂයේ විශේෂය වැඩියි. අපි වෙනස් වැඩක් හතරක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වගේ භාෂාවක් 57කට, මේ විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් වගේ, මොකක් පුදුම ව මෝර්ෆෝලෝගික විශේෂතාව භාවිත කරන්නේ වැරදි විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන්. නමුත්, මේ ප්\u200dරතිකාරය අඩුම ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් විශ්වාසිකයෙන් විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙනවා. අපි හිතන්නේ මේක තමයි මොකද විකෘතිවිද්\u200dයාවය විශේෂයෙන් විකෘත කරපු භාෂාවල් වලින්. සියළු වැඩක් හතරයි, කේස් සහ ජෙන්ඩර් වලින් විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක් තමයි වැරදි විශේෂ විශේෂ', 'so': 'Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa laba malooyin oo caadiga ah oo ku saabsan baaritaanka masaallka noocyada NLP: (i) Morphology waa wax ka sii sheegaya qaladka; iyo muhiimka morphologka ayaa kordhiya dhibaatada afka. Waxaannu muujinnaa afar shaqo oo kala duduwan iyo ilaa 57 luuqadood oo ka mid ah malayaashan, si la yaab leh, taas oo kaliya (i) waa run. Sida isticmaalka isticmaalka muuqashada ayaa bedesha sii-beddelasho khiyaano ah oo ka mid ah shaqooyinka; Si kastaba ha ahaatee, saamayntan waxaa loola hadlaa luuqadaha morphologisk oo adag. Waxaynu ka xisaabinaynaa in taas sababtoo ah in morphologu ay ka takooriso luuqadaha fudud. Dhammaan afarta shaqo, xaalada iyo jinsigu waa noocyo badan oo la sii sheegay qaladka.', 'ur': 'ہم نے NLP نمڈلوں کی خطا تحلیل میں دو مشترک معلومات کا ارزش کیا ہے: (i) Morphology is predictive of errors; اور (ii) ایک زبان کی موجود پیچیدگی کے ساتھ مرفولوژی کا اہم بڑھتا ہے۔ ہم چار مختلف کاموں میں دکھاتے ہیں اور 57 زبانوں تک یہ گمان میں سے کچھ عجیب ہے، صرف (i) سچ ہے۔ مدرفولوژیکوں کے استعمال سے کاموں میں گمراہی کی پیش بینی بہتر ہوتی ہے۔ لیکن یہ اثر کم بولتی ہے کہ مورپولوژیکی پیچیدہ زبانوں سے۔ ہم اسے مطلع کرتے ہیں کیونکہ مارفولوژی morfologically سادھی زبانوں میں زیادہ جدائی ہے۔ تمام چار دنیا، کیس اور جنس کے درمیان مورپولوژیکوں کے سب سے زیادہ غلطی کی پیش بینی کرنے والے ہیں.', 'ta': 'NLP மாதிரிகளின் பிழை ஆராய்ச்சியில் இரண்டு பொதுவான எண்ணங்களை நாம் மதிப்பிடுகிறோம்: (i) பிழையை முன்வாக்குவத (ii) மொழியின் மொழியின் மொழியின் மொழியின் மொத்த சிக்கல் முக்கியம் அதிகரிக்கிறது. நாங்கள் நான்கு வேறு வேறு வேலைகளைக் காண்பிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் 57 மொழிகளுக்கு மேல் காண்பிக்கிறோம் இந்த எண்ண செயல்கள் முழுவதும் பிழையான முன்னெழுத்தை மேம்படுத்துகிறது; ஆனால், இந்த விளைவு மோர்போலியலில் சிக்கலான மொழிகளுடன் குறைவாக குறைந்தது. நாம் நினைக்கிறோம் ஏனென்றால் மோரோபோலியலி மொழிகளில் மிகவும் எளிமையான வேறுபடுத்தப்படுகிறது. அனைத்து நான்கு பணிகளையும், கேஸ் மற்றும் பெண்களையும் முழுவதும் பிழையின் மிகவும் முன்னடிக்கப்பட்டுள்ள க', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đánh giá hai dự đoán chung trong phân tích sai lầm của mẫu NLP: i) Morphology là dự đoán sai sót; và (ii) sự quan trọng của quyết tâm quyết tâm của sự cố định tăng lên cùng với độ phức tạp của ngôn ngữ. Chúng ta cho thấy trong bốn nhiệm vụ khác nhau và cho tới số 57 ngôn ngữ rằng trong các dự án này, khá ngạc nhiên, chỉ có "i" mới đúng. Sử dụng các tính chất lịch sự cải thiện dự đoán lỗi trong các nhiệm vụ; Tuy nhiên, hiệu ứng này ít phát âm hơn với ngôn ngữ lịch sử phức tạp. Chúng tôi cho rằng đây là vì morphine là có sự phân biệt nhiều hơn ở các ngôn ngữ. Trong tất cả bốn nhiệm vụ, trường hợp và giới tính là các tính hình mẫu dự đoán sai sót nhiều nhất.', 'uz': "We evaluate two common conjectures in error analysis of NLP models: (i) Morphology is predictive of errors;  (ii) morfologi muhim tilning morfologik murakkablarini o'zgartiradi. Biz to'rtta boshqa vazifalarni ko'rsamiz va bu g'oyalarning ko'pchiligi 57 tillariga o'ylaymiz, bu g'oyalarning bir qiziqdir, faqat to'g'ri. Name Lekin, bu effekti morfologik murakkab murakkab tillar bilan gapiradi. Biz bu haqida o'ylaymiz, chunki morfologi oddiy tillarda juda ajratilgan. Hamma to'rtta vazifalar, sakkiz va jini ko'rib turganda, oddiy xususiyatlar xato haqida ko'p kutilgan.", 'hr': 'Procjenjujemo dvije zajedničke pretpostavke u analizi greške modela NLP: i) Morfologija predviđa greške; i ii) važnost morfologije povećava sa morfološkom kompleksnošću jezika. Mi pokazujemo na četiri različite zadatke i do 57 jezika da je od ovih pretpostavka malo iznenađujuće, samo i) istina. Koristenje morfoloških karakteristika poboljšava predviđanje grešaka u svim zadacima; međutim, ovaj učinak je manje proglašen morfološki složenim jezicima. Pretpostavljamo da je to zato što je morfologija diskriminacija morfološki jednostavnijim jezicima. Preko svih četiri zadatka, slučaj i spol su morfološke karakteristike koje najpredviđaju greške.', 'bg': 'Оценяваме две общи предположения при анализа на грешките на моделите на НЛП: (и) Морфологията предвижда грешки; и (ii) значението на морфологията нараства с морфологичната сложност на езика. Показваме на четири различни задачи и до 57 езика, че от тези предположения, донякъде изненадващо, само (и) е вярно. Използването на морфологични характеристики подобрява прогнозирането на грешки при задачите; Въпреки това, този ефект е по-малко изразен при морфологично сложни езици. Предполагаме, че това е така, защото морфологията е по-дискриминираща в морфологически прости езици. При всичките четири задачи случаят и пола са морфологичните характеристики, които най-предсказват грешките.', 'nl': 'We evalueren twee gangbare veronderstellingen in foutanalyse van NLP modellen: (i) Morfologie voorspelt fouten; en ii) het belang van morfologie neemt toe met de morfologische complexiteit van een taal. We tonen in vier verschillende taken en tot 57-talen dat van deze vermoedens, enigszins verrassend genoeg, alleen (i) waar is. Het gebruik van morfologische kenmerken verbetert foutvoorspelling tussen taken; Dit effect is echter minder uitgesproken bij morfologisch complexe talen. We speculeren dat dit komt omdat morfologie meer onderscheidend is in morfologisch eenvoudige talen. Over alle vier de taken zijn geval en geslacht de morfologische kenmerken die het meest voorspellen van fouten.', 'da': 'Vi evaluerer to almindelige formodninger i fejlanalyse af NLP modeller: (i) Morfologi er forudsigende for fejl; og ii) morfologiens betydning stiger med sprogets morfologiske kompleksitet. Vi viser på tværs af fire forskellige opgaver og op til 57 sprog, at af disse formodninger, noget overraskende, kun (i) er sandt. Brug af morfologiske funktioner forbedrer fejlforudsigelse på tværs af opgaver; Denne effekt er dog mindre udtalt med morfologisk komplekse sprog. Vi spekulerer på dette, fordi morfologien er mere diskriminerende i morfologisk enkle sprog. På tværs af alle fire opgaver er tilfælde og køn de morfologiske træk, der er mest forudsigende for fejl.', 'de': 'Wir evaluieren zwei gängige Vermutungen in der Fehleranalyse von NLP-Modellen: (i) Morphologie ist prädiktiv für Fehler; Die Bedeutung der Morphologie nimmt mit der morphologischen Komplexität einer Sprache zu. Wir zeigen über vier verschiedene Aufgaben und bis zu 57-Sprachen, dass diese Vermutungen etwas überraschenderweise nur (i) wahr sind. Die Verwendung morphologischer Merkmale verbessert die Fehlervorhersage über Aufgaben hinweg; Allerdings ist dieser Effekt bei morphologisch komplexen Sprachen weniger ausgeprägt. Wir vermuten, dass dies daran liegt, dass Morphologie in morphologisch einfachen Sprachen diskriminierender ist. Bei allen vier Aufgaben sind Fall und Geschlecht die morphologischen Merkmale, die Fehler am meisten vorhersagen.', 'id': 'Kami mengevaluasi dua anggapan umum dalam analisis kesalahan model NLP: (i) Morfologi adalah prediksi kesalahan; dan (ii) kepentingan morfologi meningkat dengan kompleksitas morfologi bahasa. Kami menunjukkan pada empat tugas yang berbeda dan sampai 57 bahasa bahwa dari perkiraan ini, agak mengejutkan, hanya (i) benar. Menggunakan fitur morfologi memperbaiki prediksi kesalahan di seluruh tugas; namun efek ini kurang terdengar dengan bahasa morfologis kompleks. Kami spekulasi ini karena morfologi lebih diskriminatif dalam bahasa morfologis sederhana. Across all four tasks, case and gender are the morphological features most predictive of error.', 'fa': 'ما دو فرضیه معمولی را در تحلیل خطای مدل NLP ارزیابی می کنیم: (i) مورفولوژی از خطاها پیش بینی می کند. و (ii) اهمیت مورفولوژی با پیچیدگی مورفولوژیک یک زبان افزایش می\u200cکند. ما در چهار وظیفه متفاوت و تا 57 زبان نشان می دهیم که از این تصور ها، کمی شگفت انگیز، فقط (i) حقیقت است. استفاده از ویژگی\u200cهای مورفولوژیکی پیش\u200cبینی خطا را در طول کار بهتر می\u200cکند. با این حال، این اثر کمتر با زبانهای پیچیده مورفولوژیکی است. ما تخمین می\u200cکنیم که این بخاطر این است که مورفولوژی در زبان\u200cهای ساده مورفولوژیکی جدا تر است. در تمام چهار وظیفه، پرونده و جنسی، ویژه های مورفولوژیکی که بیشترین پیش بینی از خطا هستند.', 'sw': 'Tutathmini dhana mbili za kawaida katika uchambuzi wa mifano ya NLP: (i) Utambuzi wa makosa; na umuhimu wa vifolojia unaongezeka kwa utata wa kifolojia wa lugha. Tunaonyesha zaidi ya kazi nne tofauti na kufikia lugha 57 za dhana hizi, kwa ajabu tu, ni kweli. Utumiaji vipengele vya morphological vinaweza kuboresha utabiri wa makosa katika kazi mbalimbali; Hata hivyo, athari hii haitajwa kidogo kwa lugha za kimaadilojia ngumu. Tunafikiri hili ni kwa sababu utambulisho wa kijinsia una ubaguzi zaidi katika lugha rahisi za kimaadilojia. Katika kazi zote nne, kesi na jinsia ni hoja za kimaadilojia zinazotabiriwa zaidi ya makosa.', 'ko': '우리는 NLP모델 오차 분석에서 흔히 볼 수 있는 두 가지 추측을 평가했다. (i)형태학은 오차를 예측할 수 있다.어법의 중요성은 언어의 어법의 복잡성에 따라 증가한다.우리는 네 가지 다른 임무와 57개 언어에 걸쳐 이 추측들 중 놀랍게도 (i) 만이 사실이라는 것을 보여 주었다.형태학적 특징을 사용하면 임무 간의 잘못된 예측을 개선할 수 있다.그러나 이런 효과는 형태가 복잡한 언어에서는 뚜렷하지 않다.형태학이 형태학의 간단한 언어에서 더욱 변별력을 가지기 때문으로 추정된다.모든 네 가지 임무 중 병례와 성별은 오류를 가장 잘 예측하는 형태학적 특징이다.', 'am': 'የNLP ዓይነቶች በማስተካከል ሁለት የተለየ ሁኔታዎችን እናሳውቃለን:(i) ሞርፎሎጂ ስህተቶችን ለመፍጠር ነው:: የሞሮፎሎጂ ግንኙነት በቋንቋ ሙከራ ይጨመርበታል፡፡ በአራቱ ልዩ ስራዎችን እናሳየዋለን እና እስከ 57 ቋንቋዎች እናደርጋለን፡፡ የሞሮፎሎጂ ምርጫዎች በመጠቀም የስህተት ትንቢት በማድረግ ያበዛል፤ ነገር ግን ይህ ጥያቄ በሞሮፎሎጂ በተጨማሪው ቋንቋ ይናገራል፡፡ ይህ ምክንያት ሞሮፎሎጂ በሞሮፎሎጂ ቀላል ቋንቋዎች የሚለይ ነው ብለን እንቆጥራለን፡፡ በሁሉም አራት ስራ፣ ቁጥር እና ሴት የሞፎሎጂ ስህተት አብዛኛውን ስህተት ለመፍጠር ነው፡፡', 'tr': 'NLP nusgalarynyň ýüzünde iki orta sanly pikirleri çykýarys: (i) Marfologiýa ýalňyşlyklaryň töwerekde bolup geçýändir; we (ii) morfologiýanyň wajyplygyny bir diliň morfologiýalyk karmaşıklygynda artýar. Biz dört dürli zadyň arasynda we 57 dile çenli bu ynamlaryň haýry bolandygyny görkeýäris. morfolojik üýtgewleri ulanmakda hata täbliklerniň önlemegini gowydyrýar; Ýöne bu etki morfolojik karmaşık diller bilen azajyk edilmez. Biz muny takyklaýarys çünki morfologiýa morfologiýaly basit dillerde döwletlikdir. Bütün dört işden, kiçi we jentiller üçin morfolojik özellikleri ýalňyşyň has öňünden gelen täsirlerdir.', 'af': "Ons evalueer twee gemeenskaplike verwerkinge in fout analisie van NLP modele: (i) Morfologie is voorskoubaar van foute; en (ii) die belangrikheid van morfologie vergroot met die morfologiese kompleksiteit van 'n taal. Ons wys oor vier verskillende taak en tot by 57 tale wat van hierdie verwerkinge is, iets verwonderbaar, slegs i is waar. Die gebruik van morfologiese funksies verbeter fout voorskou oor opdragte; maar hierdie effek is minder uitgevoer met morfologiese komplekse tale. Ons spekuleer hierdie is omdat morfologie meer diskrimineer is in morfologies eenvoudige tale. Oor al vier opdragte, kase en geneem is die morfologiese funksies wat mees voorskoubaar van fout is.", 'hy': 'We evaluate two common conjectures in error analysis of NLP models: (i) Morphology is predictive of errors;  և 2) մորֆոլոգիայի կարևորությունը աճում է լեզվի մորֆոլոգիական բարդությամբ: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս չորս տարբեր խնդիրների և մինչև 57 լեզուների ընթացքում, որ այս ենթադրություններից, ինչ-որ չափով զարմանալի է, միայն i-ը ճիշտ է: Մորֆոլոգիական հատկանիշների օգտագործումը բարելավում է ձախողումների կանխատեսումը բոլոր խնդիրներում: սակայն, այս ազդեցությունը ավելի քիչ արտահայտվում է մորֆոլոգիապես բարդ լեզուներով: Մենք ենթադրում ենք, որ մորֆոլոգիան ավելի խտրականում է մորֆոլոգիապես պարզ լեզուներում: Բոլոր չորս խնդիրների ընթացքում, դեպքերը և սեռը սխալների ամենականխատեսող մորֆոլոգիական հատկություններն են:', 'sq': 'We evaluate two common conjectures in error analysis of NLP models: (i) Morphology is predictive of errors;  and (ii) the importance of morphology increases with the morphological complexity of a language.  Ne tregojmë në katër detyra të ndryshme dhe deri në 57 gjuhë se nga këto supozime, disi befasuese, vetëm (i) është e vërtetë. Përdorimi i karakteristikave morfologjike përmirëson parashikimin e gabimeve nëpërmjet detyrave; megjithatë, ky efekt është më pak i shprehur me gjuhë morfologjikisht komplekse. Ne mendojmë se kjo është sepse morfologjia është më diskriminuese në gjuhë morfologjike të thjeshta. Në të katër detyrat, rasti dhe gjini janë karakteristikat morfologjike më parashikuese të gabimeve.', 'az': 'Biz NLP modell…ôrin x…ôta analizind…ô iki ortaq z…ônn…ô deńüerlendiririk: i) Morfoloji x…ôtalarńĪn t…ôdbir edir; v…ô ii) bir dilin morfolojisinin m√ľnasib…ôtini artńĪrar. Biz d√∂rd m√ľxt…ôlif i Ňül…ôr arasńĪnda v…ô 57 dil…ô q…ôd…ôr bu z…ônnl…ôrd…ôn b…ôzi t…ô…ôcc√ľbl√ľ, yalnńĪz i dońürudur. Morfolojik x√ľsusiyy…ôtl…ôrd…ôn istifad…ô etm…ôk iŇül…ôrd…ô x…ôta t…ôdbirl…ôrini yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrńĪr. Ancaq bu t…ôsiri morfolojik kompleks dill…ôrl…ô daha azdńĪr. Biz bunu t…ômin edirik, √ß√ľnki morfoloji morfolojik olaraq basit dill…ôrd…ô daha diskriminat edir. B√ľt√ľn d√∂rd iŇül…ôr, m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôr v…ô cins arasńĪnda …ôn √ßox x…ôtanńĪn t…ôdbir edil…ôn morfolojik x√ľsusiyy…ôtl…ôridir.', 'bs': 'Procjenjujemo dvije zajedničke pretpostavke u analizi greške modela NLP: i) Morfologija predviđa greške; i ii) važnost morfologije povećava sa morfološkom kompleksnošću jezika. Mi pokazujemo na četiri različite zadatke i do 57 jezika da je od ovih pretpostavka malo iznenađujuće, samo i) istina. Koristenje morfoloških karakteristika poboljšava predviđanje grešaka u svim zadacima; Međutim, ovaj učinak je manje proglašen morfološki kompleksnim jezicima. Pretpostavljamo da je to zato što je morfologija diskriminacija morfološki jednostavnijim jezicima. Preko svih četiri zadatka, slučaj i spol su morfološke karakteristike koje su najpredvidljivije od greške.', 'bn': 'এনএলপি মডেলের ভুল বিশ্লেষণে আমরা দুটি সাধারণ ধারণা মূল্যায়ন করি: (i) মরোফোলজি ভুলের ভবিষ্যৎবাণী; and (ii) the importance of morphology increases with the morphological complexity of a language.  আমরা চার ভিন্ন ভিন্ন কাজের মধ্যে দেখাচ্ছি এবং ৫৭ ভাষার মধ্যে প্রায় দেখাচ্ছি যে এই ধারণার মধ্যে কিছু বিস্ময়কর, শ মরোফোলিক্যাল বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করে কাজের বিভিন্ন ভুল ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী উন্নত করে; তবে এই প্রভাব মোরফোলজিক ভাষায় জটিল ভাষার সাথে কম উল্লেখ করা হয়েছে। আমরা ধারণা করছি এটা কারণ মরোফোলজি নৈতিক ভাষায় আরো বৈষম্য। সকল চার কাজ, কেস এবং লিঙ্গের মধ্যে তারা ভুলের সবচেয়ে ভবিষ্যৎবাণী বৈশিষ্ট্য।', 'cs': 'Hodnotíme dvě běžné domněnky v analýze chyb NLP modelů: (i) Morfologie je prediktivní chyby; a ii) význam morfologie roste s morfologickou složitostí jazyka. Ukazujeme napříč čtyřmi různými úkoly a až do 57 jazyků, že z těchto domněnek je poněkud překvapivě pravda pouze (i). Použití morfologických vlastností zlepšuje predikci chyb napříč úkoly; Tento efekt je však méně výrazný u morfologicky složitých jazyků. Domníváme se, že je to proto, že morfologie je v morfologicky jednoduchých jazycích diskriminativnější. Ve všech čtyřech úkolech jsou případ a pohlaví morfologické rysy nejvíce prediktivní chyby.', 'ca': "Evaluam dues conjectures comunes en l'anàlisi d'errors dels models NLP: (i) la morfologia és preditiva d'errors; i ii) la importància de la morfologia augmenta amb la complexitat morfològica d'un llenguatge. Mostrem a través de quatre tasques diferents i fins a 57 llengües que d'aquestes conjectures, sorprenentment, només i) és veritat. Utilitzar característiques morfològiques millora la predicció d'errors en les tasques; però aquest efecte és menys pronunciat amb llengües morfològicament complexes. Espectulem que això és perquè la morfologia és més discriminativa en llengües morfològicament senzilles. En les quatre tasques, el cas i el gènere són les característiques morfològiques més preditives d'errors.", 'et': 'NLP mudelite veaanalüüsis hindame kahte levinud oletust: (i) Morfoloogia ennustab vigu; ja ii) morfoloogia tähtsus suureneb koos keele morfoloogilise keerukusega. Me näitame läbi neli erinevat ülesannet ja kuni 57 keeles, et need oletused, mõnevõrra üllatav, ainult (i) on tõsi. morfoloogiliste funktsioonide kasutamine parandab vigade prognoosimist ülesannete lõikes; Siiski on see efekt morfoloogiliselt keerukate keelte puhul vähem väljendunud. Me spekuleerime seda seetõttu, et morfoloogia on morfoloogiliselt lihtsates keeltes diskrimineerivam. Kõigi nelja ülesande puhul on juhtum ja sugu morfoloogilised tunnused, mis ennustavad kõige rohkem vigu.', 'fi': 'Arvioimme kahta yleistä oletusta NLP-mallien virheanalyysissä: (i) Morfologia ennustaa virheitä; ja (ii) morfologian merkitys kasvaa kielen morfologisen monimutkaisuuden myötä. Osoitamme neljällä eri tehtävällä ja jopa 57 kielellä, että näistä olettamuksista, jokseenkin yllättävää, vain (i) on totta. Morfologisten ominaisuuksien käyttäminen parantaa virheiden ennustamista eri tehtävissä; Tämä vaikutus on kuitenkin vähemmän ilmeinen morfologisesti monimutkaisilla kielillä. Arvelemme tämän johtuvan siitä, että morfologia on erottelevampi morfologisesti yksinkertaisilla kielillä. Kaikissa neljässä tehtävässä tapaus ja sukupuoli ovat morfologisia ominaisuuksia, jotka ennustavat eniten virheitä.', 'he': 'אנו מעריכים שתי הניחושות משותפות בניתוח שגיאות של דוגמנים NLP: (i) מורפולוגיה היא צפייה של שגיאות; (ii) חשיבות המורפולוגיה מגבילה עם המורכבות המורפולוגית של שפה. We show across four different tasks and up to 57 languages that of these conjectures, somewhat surprisingly, only (i) is true.  השימוש בתחומים מורפולוגיים משפר את חיזוי טעויות בין המשימות; בכל אופן, השפעה הזאת פחות מוכרת בשפה מורפולוגית מורכבת. אנחנו משערים שזה בגלל שמורפולוגיה היא יותר דיסקרטיבית בשפות פשוטות מבחינה מורפולוגית. בכל ארבעה משימות, מקרה ומין הם המאפיינים המורפולוגיים הכי צפויים של טעות.', 'ha': "Mu ƙaddara zato biyu mai ɗayan zato a cikin anayyar misãlai na NLP: (i) Mafolojiya na gabatar da ɓata; and (ii) the importance of morphology increases with the morphological complexity of a language.  Munã nũna wa aikin huɗu dabam-dabam kuma zuwa 57 harsunan da ke cikin waɗannan zato, da abu mai ban mãkirci, sai gaskiya ne. Yi amfani da fassarar morfologi ya ƙara bayani ga aikin; A lokacin da, za'a bayyana wannan fikan da harshen morfologi masu kambu. Tuna ƙayyade wannan ne dõmin mutfologi na fi zama da rabo a cikin harshen mutfologi masu sauƙi. Akwai duk aikin huɗu, masu sakan da mazan jini sune mafiya motsi daga ɓata.", 'sk': 'Ocenjujemo dve pogosti domnevi pri analizi napak modelov NLP: (i) Morfologija napoveduje napake; in (ii) pomen morfologije narašča z morfološko kompleksnostjo jezika. V štirih različnih nalogah in do 57 jezikih pokažemo, da je od teh domnev, nekoliko presenetljivo, le (i) resnično. Uporaba morfoloških značilnosti izboljša napovedovanje napak pri opravilih; Vendar pa je ta učinek manj izrazit pri morfološko kompleksnih jezikih. Ugibamo, da je morfologija bolj diskriminativna v morfološko preprostih jezikih. Pri vseh štirih nalogah sta primer in spol morfološki značilnosti, ki najbolj napovedujejo napako.', 'jv': 'Awakdhéwé énlui perusahaan langgar sampeyan gak dhéwé kanggo nyealusi NLP model: lan Awak dhéwé menehi tanggal 4 nggo sampek lan sampek 75 langa sing paling iki dadi, lho sampek, njuk tenan (i) sing apik. tutorial_basic politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé ngerti kuwi punika dipun-punika dipun kuwi, merang kapan ning langgar luwih apik. ProgressBarUpdates', 'bo': 'འུ་ཅག་གིས་NLP མིག་ཆའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ནང་མཐུན་བརྗོད་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གཉིས་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྟར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། སྐད་ཡིག་ཅིག་གི་དབྱེ་རིག་གལ་ཆེ་ཤིན་དུ་འགྱུར་བ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་འཆར་གཞི་འདི་དག་གི་ལས་འགན་འདི་བཞིན་ལས་བརྗོད་བྱས་མིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་བཏོན་ཡོད། དྲ་སྐུལ་ཆ་རྐྱེན་སྟངས་བེད་སྤྱོད་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་གྱི་རྔོན་སྟངས་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ། ཡིན་ནའང་། དབྱངས་འགྲོས་ཀྱིས་མཐོང་ཆེ་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་དང་དྲན་བསྐུལ་མེད་པས། ང་ཚོས་རྟོགས་འདི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི་དབྱེ་རིག་དེ་སྣང་ཚུལ་གྱིས་མཐོང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ནང་ཏུ་ཆེ་མཐོང་མི་འདུག བྱ་བ་འདི་བཞིན་དག་གི་ནང་དུ་རྣམ་པ་དང་སྐྱེས་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཐོང་སྣང་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡོད་པའི་གཟུགས་རིས་ཆེས་ས'}
{'en': 'Attention-based Relational Graph Convolutional Network for Target-Oriented Opinion Words Extraction', 'es': 'Red convolucional de gráficos relacionales basados en la atención para la extracción de palabras de opinión orientadas a objetivos', 'ar': 'الشبكة التلافيفية للرسم البياني القائم على الانتباه لاستخراج كلمات الرأي الموجهة نحو الهدف', 'pt': 'Rede Convolucional de Gráfico Relacional Baseado em Atenção para Extração de Palavras de Opinião Orientadas ao Alvo', 'fr': "Réseau convolutif de graphe relationnel basé sur l'attention pour l'extraction de mots d'opinion orientés vers la cible", 'ja': 'ターゲット指向のオピニオンワード抽出のためのアテンションベースのリレーショナルグラフ畳み込みネットワーク', 'hi': 'ध्यान आधारित संबंधपरक ग्राफ़ लक्ष्य-उन्मुख राय शब्द निष्कर्षण के लिए नेटवर्क', 'zh': '盖注意之图卷积网络,所以向向之意见词取也', 'ru': 'Сверточная сеть реляционного графа, основанная на внимании, для извлечения слов мнения, ориентированных на цель', 'ga': 'Líonra Comhdhlúite Graf Coibhneasta atá Bunaithe ar Aird le haghaidh Eastóscadh Focail Tuairimíochta Dírithe ar Sprioc', 'el': 'Σχετικό Σύγκλητο Δίκτυο Σχετικών Γράφων με βάση την προσοχή για την εξαγωγή λέξεων γνώμης με προσανατολισμό στο στόχο', 'ka': 'ატრუქციის დაბათებული რერაქციალური გრაფის კონტულუციალური ქსელი მისახედვით დაწყვეტილი მისახედვის სიტყვების ექსტრექციისთვის', 'hu': 'Figyelem-alapú kapcsolati grafikon Konvolúciós hálózat a célorientált vélemény szavak kivonásához', 'lt': 'Į tikslą orientuotos nuomonės žodžių ekstrakcijos santykinis grafikų konvoliucinis tinklas, pagrįstas dėmesiu', 'it': "Rete conveluzionale basata sull'attenzione per l'estrazione di parole di opinione orientate all'obiettivo", 'kk': 'Қарапайым негіздеген қатынастық график қатынастық мәліметтерді тарқату желі', 'ml': 'ലക്ഷ്യത്തിനുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d പുറത്താക്കുന്നതിനായി ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുക', 'mk': 'Релативна конволуционална мрежа на графици базирана на внимание за екстракција на зборови за мислење ориентирани на целта', 'mt': 'Netwerk Relattiv ta’ Konvenzjoni tal-Grafiki bbażat fuq l-Attenzjoni għall-Estrazzjoni tal-Kliem tal-Opinjoni Orientata lejn il-Mira', 'no': 'Attention-based Relational Graph Convolutional Network for Objectoriented Opinion Words Extraction', 'pl': 'Sieć konwolucyjna oparta na uwadze dla ekstrakcji słów opinii zorientowanych na cel', 'ms': 'Name', 'mn': 'Attention-based Relational Graph Convolutional Network for Target-Oriented Opinion Words Extraction', 'so': 'Internetka ku saabsan xiriirka Graph Convolution Network for Target-oriented Opinion Words Extraction', 'ro': 'Grafic relațional bazat pe atenție Rețeaua convoluțională pentru extragerea cuvintelor de opinie orientate spre țintă', 'ta': 'Name', 'sr': 'Konvolucionalna mreža vezanih grafa na pažnji za izvlačenje riječi iz cilja orijentirane mišljenje', 'sv': 'Uppmärksamhet baserad relationsgraf Konvulutionellt nätverk för målorienterade yttrandeord extraktion', 'ur': 'Target-Oriented Opinion Words Extraction', 'si': 'Attension-based සම්බන්ධ ග්\u200dරාෆ් සම්බන්ධ ජාල', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hệ thống thuyết phục về lời nói hướng về đích', 'bg': 'Базирана на вниманието относителна графика Конволюционна мрежа за извличане на целенасочено ориентирани думи на мнение', 'da': 'Opmærksomhedsbaseret Relational Graph Konvolutionsnetværk for målorienterede meningsord uddrag', 'nl': 'Aandacht-gebaseerd Relationeel Grafisch Convolutioneel Netwerk voor Doelgerichte Opiniewoorden Extractie', 'hr': 'Uzbunjena vezna mreža grafa konvolucionalne mreže za izvlačenje riječi iz cilja orijentiranih mišljenja', 'de': 'Aufmerksamkeitsbasiertes Relational Graph Convolutional Network für zielgerichtete Meinungswortextraktion', 'id': 'Jaringan Konvelusi Graf Relatif Berdasarkan Perhatian untuk Ekstraksi Kata Opsyen Orientasi Target', 'fa': 'توجه به گراف ارتباطی رابطه برای اخراج کلمات توجه به هدف', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa Uchaguzi wa Graph wa Kuhusiana na Uhusiano wa Kujitoleza Orodha za Uchaguzi', 'tr': 'Saglym Zolaky Graph Mazmunlary Açmak üçin Mazmunlar Saýlaw Sözleri Açmak', 'af': 'Aangaande-gebaseerde Relatiewe Graaf Konvolusionele Netwerk vir Teël-Orienteerde Besonderhede Woord Uitpakking', 'ko': '주의적 관계 그래프 볼륨 네트워크를 바탕으로 목표를 향한 관점어 추출', 'sq': 'Rrjeti konvolutiv relativ i grafikut të bazuar në vëmendje për nxjerrjen e fjalëve të opinionit të orientuar në objektiv', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Ուշադրության վրա հիմնված հարաբերական գրաֆի հակառակցման ցանցը', 'az': 'Gözəl-Orientli Saqlama Sözlərinin İlişkisi Grafik İlişkisi Ağı', 'bn': 'টার্জেট- oriented Opinion Words Extraction এর জন্য আকর্ষণীয় গ্রাফ কনভোলিয়েশন নেটওয়ার্ক', 'bs': 'Na temelju pažnje vezna grafa konvolucionalna mreža za izvlačenje riječi iz cilja orijentirane mišljenje', 'ca': "Rede de conversió de gràfics relatius basada en l'atenció per a l'extracció de paraules d'opinió orientada a l'objectiu", 'cs': 'Pozornost založená na relačním grafu Convoluční síť pro extrakci cílově orientovaných názorových slov', 'et': 'Tähelepanu põhinev suhteline graafik Sihtmärkidele orienteeritud arvamussõnade väljavõtmise konvolutsioonivõrgustik', 'fi': 'Huomioon perustuva suhteellinen kaavio Konvolutional Network for Target-Oriented Opinion Words Extraction', 'jv': 'Attention-basic Relal Graph convolution Network for TarGet-Oriented Resolution Word extract', 'sk': 'Konvolucijska mreža za ciljno usmerjene mnenjske besede, ki temelji na pozornosti', 'he': 'Name', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Attention-based Relational Graph Convolutional Network for Target-Oriented Opinion Words Extraction'}
{'en': 'Target-oriented opinion words extraction (TOWE) is a subtask of aspect-based sentiment analysis (ABSA). It aims to extract the corresponding opinion words for a given opinion target in a review sentence. Intuitively, the relation between an opinion target and an opinion word mostly relies on syntactics. In this study, we design a directed syntactic dependency graph based on a dependency tree to establish a path from the target to candidate opinions. Subsequently, we propose a novel attention-based relational graph convolutional neural network (ARGCN) to exploit syntactic information over dependency graphs. Moreover, to explicitly extract the corresponding opinion words toward the given opinion target, we effectively encode target information in our model with the target-aware representation. Empirical results demonstrate that our model significantly outperforms all of the existing models on four benchmark datasets. Extensive analysis also demonstrates the effectiveness of each component of our models. Our code is available at https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'ar': 'استخراج كلمات الرأي الموجه نحو الهدف (TOWE) هو مهمة فرعية لتحليل المشاعر القائمة على الجانب (ABSA). يهدف إلى استخراج كلمات الرأي المقابلة لهدف رأي معين في جملة مراجعة. بشكل حدسي ، تعتمد العلاقة بين هدف الرأي وكلمة الرأي في الغالب على القواعد النحوية. في هذه الدراسة ، قمنا بتصميم مخطط تبعية نحوي موجه بناءً على شجرة التبعية لإنشاء مسار من الهدف إلى آراء المرشحين. بعد ذلك ، نقترح شبكة عصبية تلافيفية (ARGCN) جديدة قائمة على الاهتمام تعتمد على الانتباه لاستغلال المعلومات النحوية على الرسوم البيانية التبعية. علاوة على ذلك ، لاستخراج كلمات الرأي المقابلة صراحةً تجاه هدف الرأي المحدد ، نقوم بترميز المعلومات الهدف بشكل فعال في نموذجنا مع التمثيل الواعي للهدف. توضح النتائج التجريبية أن نموذجنا يتفوق بشكل كبير على جميع النماذج الحالية في أربع مجموعات بيانات معيارية. يوضح التحليل الشامل أيضًا فعالية كل مكون من مكونات نماذجنا. الكود الخاص بنا متاح على https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'es': 'La extracción de palabras de opinión orientadas a objetivos (TOWE) es una subtarea del análisis de opinión basado en aspectos (ABSA). Su objetivo es extraer las palabras de opinión correspondientes para un objetivo de opinión dado en una oración de revisión. Intuitivamente, la relación entre un objetivo de opinión y una palabra de opinión se basa principalmente en la sintáctica. En este estudio, diseñamos un gráfico de dependencia sintáctica dirigida basado en un árbol de dependencias para establecer un camino desde el objetivo hasta las opiniones de los candidatos. Posteriormente, proponemos una novedosa red neuronal convolucional de gráficos relacionales basados en la atención (ARGCN) para aprovechar la información sintáctica sobre los gráficos de dependencia. Además, para extraer explícitamente las palabras de opinión correspondientes hacia el objetivo de opinión dado, codificamos eficazmente la información del objetivo en nuestro modelo con la representación consciente del objetivo. Los resultados empíricos demuestran que nuestro modelo supera significativamente a todos los modelos existentes en cuatro conjuntos de datos de referencia. Un análisis exhaustivo también demuestra la eficacia de cada componente de nuestros modelos. Nuestro código está disponible en https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'fr': "L'extraction des mots d'opinion orientés vers la cible (TOWE) est une sous-tâche de l'analyse des sentiments basée sur les aspects (ABSA). Il vise à extraire les mots d'opinion correspondants pour une cible d'opinion donnée dans une phrase de révision. Intuitivement, la relation entre une cible d'opinion et un mot d'opinion repose principalement sur la syntaxe. Dans cette étude, nous concevons un graphe de dépendance syntaxique dirigé basé sur un arbre de dépendance afin d'établir un chemin entre la cible et les opinions des candidats. Par la suite, nous proposons un nouveau réseau neuronal convolutionnel de graphe relationnel basé sur l'attention (ARGCN) pour exploiter les informations syntaxiques par rapport aux graphes de dépendance. De plus, pour extraire explicitement les mots d'opinion correspondants vers la cible d'opinion donnée, nous encodons efficacement les informations de la cible dans notre modèle avec la représentation sensible à la cible. Les résultats empiriques montrent que notre modèle surpasse de manière significative tous les modèles existants sur quatre ensembles de données de référence. Une analyse approfondie démontre également l'efficacité de chaque composant de nos modèles. Notre code est disponible sur https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.", 'pt': 'A extração de palavras de opinião orientadas ao alvo (TOWE) é uma subtarefa da análise de sentimentos baseada em aspectos (ABSA). Ele visa extrair as palavras de opinião correspondentes para um determinado alvo de opinião em uma frase de revisão. Intuitivamente, a relação entre um alvo de opinião e uma palavra de opinião depende principalmente da sintaxe. Neste estudo, projetamos um grafo de dependência sintática direcionada com base em uma árvore de dependência para estabelecer um caminho do alvo para as opiniões dos candidatos. Posteriormente, propomos uma nova rede neural convolucional de grafos relacionais baseada em atenção (ARGCN) para explorar informações sintáticas sobre grafos de dependência. Além disso, para extrair explicitamente as palavras de opinião correspondentes para o alvo de opinião fornecido, codificamos efetivamente as informações do alvo em nosso modelo com a representação consciente do alvo. Os resultados empíricos demonstram que nosso modelo supera significativamente todos os modelos existentes em quatro conjuntos de dados de referência. A análise extensiva também demonstra a eficácia de cada componente de nossos modelos. Nosso código está disponível em https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'ja': 'ターゲット指向の意見抽出（ TOWE ）は、アスペクトベースの感情分析（ ABSA ）のサブタスクです。 レビュー文で与えられた意見対象に対して対応する意見語を抽出することを目的としている。 直感的には、オピニオンターゲットとオピニオンワードの関係は、ほとんどの場合構文に依存します。 この研究では、依存性ツリーに基づいて、ターゲットから候補者の意見へのパスを確立するための有向構文依存性グラフを設計します。 続いて、依存関係グラフ上で構文情報を利用するための新規の注意に基づく関係グラフ畳み込みニューラルネットワーク（ ARGCN ）を提案する。 さらに、与えられた意見ターゲットに向けて対応する意見の単語を明示的に抽出するために、ターゲット認識表現でターゲット情報を効果的にモデルにエンコードします。 実証結果は、当社のモデルが、4つのベンチマークデータセット上の既存のすべてのモデルを大幅に上回っていることを示しています。 広範な分析はまた、モデルの各コンポーネントの有効性を示しています。 コードはhttps://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eaclから入手できます。', 'hi': 'लक्ष्य-उन्मुख राय शब्द निष्कर्षण (TOWE) पहलू-आधारित भावना विश्लेषण (ABSA) का एक उप-कार्य है। इसका उद्देश्य समीक्षा वाक्य में दिए गए राय लक्ष्य के लिए संबंधित राय शब्दों को निकालना है। Intuitively, एक राय लक्ष्य और एक राय शब्द के बीच संबंध ज्यादातर वाक्यात्मक पर निर्भर करता है। इस अध्ययन में, हम उम्मीदवार राय के लिए लक्ष्य से एक पथ स्थापित करने के लिए एक निर्भरता पेड़ के आधार पर एक निर्देशित वाक्यात्मक निर्भरता ग्राफ डिजाइन करते हैं। इसके बाद, हम निर्भरता रेखांकन पर वाक्यात्मक जानकारी का फायदा उठाने के लिए एक उपन्यास ध्यान-आधारित संबंधपरक ग्राफ कनवल्शनल न्यूरल नेटवर्क (ARGCN) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। इसके अलावा, दिए गए राय लक्ष्य की ओर संबंधित राय शब्दों को स्पष्ट रूप से निकालने के लिए, हम लक्ष्य-जागरूक प्रतिनिधित्व के साथ अपने मॉडल में लक्ष्य जानकारी को प्रभावी ढंग से एन्कोड करते हैं। अनुभवजन्य परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल चार बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर सभी मौजूदा मॉडलों को काफी हद तक बेहतर बनाता है। व्यापक विश्लेषण भी हमारे मॉडल के प्रत्येक घटक की प्रभावशीलता को दर्शाता है। हमारा कोड https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl पर उपलब्ध है।', 'ru': 'Целевое извлечение слов мнения (TOWE) является подзадачей анализа настроений на основе аспектов (ABSA). Он направлен на извлечение соответствующих слов мнения для данной целевой аудитории в рецензируемом предложении. Интуитивно, связь между целью мнения и словом мнения в основном зависит от синтаксики. В этом исследовании мы создаем направленный синтаксический график зависимости на основе дерева зависимостей, чтобы установить путь от цели к мнениям кандидатов. Впоследствии мы предлагаем новую, основанную на внимании, реляционную графовую сверточную нейронную сеть (ARGCN) для использования синтаксической информации над графиками зависимости. Кроме того, чтобы явно извлечь соответствующие слова мнения в направлении заданного целевого мнения, мы эффективно кодируем целевую информацию в нашей модели с целеустремленным представлением. Эмпирические результаты показывают, что наша модель значительно превосходит все существующие модели по четырем эталонным наборам данных. Обширный анализ также демонстрирует эффективность каждого компонента наших моделей. Наш код доступен по адресу https://github.com/wcwowwww/towe-eacl.', 'zh': '向之意见词取(TOWE)盖情析(ABSA)之任也。 其指为论句之给定取相应之意见词。 直观曰:意之所在,意之所在,句法也。 于此论之,设一基于依树者有向句法恃于关图,以立从至选之路。 既而建一新颖之图卷积神经网络(ARGCN),以资句法息。 所以示给定者显式取其意见词,效其感知,编码其信也。 经验结果表明,我四准数集上显优于所有。 博论犹验吾模形之组件有效性。 吾代码可 https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl。', 'ga': 'Is fothasc d’anailís meoin atá bunaithe ar ghnéithe (ABSA) é eastóscadh focal tuairime atá dírithe ar spriocanna (TOWE). Tá sé mar aidhm aige na focail tuairime comhfhreagracha a bhaint as sprioc tuairime tugtha in abairt athbhreithnithe. Go hintinneach, braitheann an gaol idir sprioc thuairim agus focal tuairime go príomha ar chomhréireanna. Sa staidéar seo, dearaimid graf spleáchais chomhréire dírithe bunaithe ar chrann spleáchais chun cosán a bhunú ón sprioc go dtí tuairimí iarrthóra. Ina dhiaidh sin, molaimid líonra néarach comhréire (ARGCN) nua atá bunaithe ar aird, chun leas a bhaint as faisnéis chomhréire thar ghraif spleáchais. Ina theannta sin, chun na focail tuairime comhfhreagracha a bhaint go sainráite i dtreo na sprice tuairime a thugtar, déanaimid ionchódú éifeachtach ar spriocfhaisnéis inár múnla leis an ionadaíocht atá feasach ar an sprioc. Léiríonn torthaí eimpíreacha go sáraíonn ár samhail na samhlacha reatha ar fad ar cheithre thacar sonraí tagarmhairc. Léiríonn anailís fhairsing freisin éifeachtacht gach comhpháirte dár múnlaí. Tá ár gcód ar fáil ag https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'el': 'Η εξαγωγή λέξεων γνώμης με προσανατολισμό στον στόχο (TOWE) είναι μια υποταγή της ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων βάσει πτυχών (ABSA). Στόχος του είναι η εξαγωγή των αντίστοιχων λέξεων γνώμης για έναν δεδομένο στόχο γνώμης σε μια πρόταση ανασκόπησης. Διαισθητικά, η σχέση μεταξύ ενός στόχου γνώμης και μιας λέξης γνώμης βασίζεται κυρίως στη σύνταξη. Σε αυτή τη μελέτη, σχεδιάζουμε ένα κατευθυνόμενο συντακτικό γράφημα εξάρτησης βασισμένο σε ένα δέντρο εξάρτησης για να καθορίσουμε μια διαδρομή από τον στόχο στις υποψήφιες απόψεις. Στη συνέχεια, προτείνουμε ένα νέο σχεσιακό νευρωνικό δίκτυο με βάση την προσοχή (ARGCN) για την εκμετάλλευση συντακτικών πληροφοριών πάνω από γραφήματα εξάρτησης. Επιπλέον, για να εξαγάγουμε ρητά τις αντίστοιχες λέξεις γνώμης προς τον δεδομένο στόχο γνώμης, κωδικοποιούμε αποτελεσματικά τις πληροφορίες στόχου στο μοντέλο μας με την απεικόνιση στόχου. Τα εμπειρικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά σημαντικά όλα τα υπάρχοντα μοντέλα σε τέσσερα σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς. Η εκτεταμένη ανάλυση καταδεικνύει επίσης την αποτελεσματικότητα κάθε στοιχείου των μοντέλων μας. Ο κωδικός μας είναι διαθέσιμος στο https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'ka': 'მიდგენტის განსაზღვრებული სიტყვები ექსტრექცია (TOWE) არის აპექტიმენტის ანალიზაციის (ABSA) სკენტიკური კითხვა. მას მიზეზია, რომ შესაბამისი წარმოდგენების სიტყვების გამოყენება განსაკუთრებული მიზეზეზის მიზეზეზეზეზეზიდან. ინტვირციურად, მისანიშნობის მიზეზი და მისანიშნობის სიტყვა უფრო მეტი სინტაქტიკაზე დარწმუნება. ამ კვლევაში, ჩვენ დავყენებთ სინტაქტიური დასამხრებელობის გრაფიკი, რომელიც დავამხრებელობის ხე დაბაზიან, რომ მისაწყისგან კონდიდეტური მისანიშვნებისთვის გადავ შემდეგ, ჩვენ ახალგაზრდებით ახალგაზრულ ახალგაზრულ გრაფიკური კონგულუციონალური ნეიროლური ქსელი დამატებით, რომ განსხვავებული წარმოდგენების სიტყვების მიხედვით, ჩვენ ეფექტიურად მიხედვის ინფორმაციას ჩვენი მოდელში მიხედვით მიხედვით განსხვავებული გამოსახულება. ჩვენი მოდელია ძალიან უფრო მეტად გავაკეთებს ყველა არსებული მოდელის ოთხი ბენქმარკის მონაცემებზე. ჩვენი მოდელეების ყველა კომპონენტების ეფექტიურობის გამოსახულება. ჩვენი კოდის შესაძლებელია https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'hu': 'Célorientált vélemény szavak extrakciója (TOWE) az aspect-based sentiment elemzés (ABSA) alterjedelme. Célja, hogy egy adott véleménycélra vonatkozó megfelelő véleményszavakat egy felülvizsgálati mondatban kivonja. Intuitív módon egy véleménycél és egy véleményszó közötti kapcsolat leginkább a szintaktikán alapul. Ebben a tanulmányban egy irányított szintaktikus függőségi grafikont tervezünk egy függőségi fa alapján, hogy megállapítsuk az utat a céltól a jelöltek véleményéig. Ezt követően egy új figyelem-alapú relációs gráf convolucionális neurális hálózatot (ARGCN) javasolunk a függőségi gráfokon felüli szintaktikus információk kihasználására. Emellett annak érdekében, hogy a megfelelő véleményszavakat kifejezetten kivonjuk az adott véleménycél felé, hatékonyan kódoljuk a célinformációkat modellünkben a céltudatos reprezentációval. Az empirikus eredmények azt mutatják, hogy modellünk jelentősen felülmúlja az összes meglévő modellt négy referenciaadatkészleten. Az átfogó elemzések azt is bizonyítják, hogy modelleink minden egyes alkotóelemének hatékonysága milyen. A kódunk elérhető a következő címen: https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'it': "L'estrazione mirata delle parole di opinione (TOWE) è una sottomissione dell'analisi del sentiment basata sugli aspetti (ABSA). Esso mira a estrarre le parole corrispondenti per un determinato obiettivo di parere in una frase di revisione. Intuitivamente, la relazione tra un target di opinione e una parola di opinione si basa principalmente sulla sintattica. In questo studio, progettiamo un grafico sintattico diretto basato su un albero delle dipendenze per stabilire un percorso dal target alle opinioni dei candidati. Successivamente, proponiamo un nuovo grafico relazionale basato sull'attenzione (ARGCN) per sfruttare le informazioni sintattiche sui grafici di dipendenza. Inoltre, per estrarre esplicitamente le parole di opinione corrispondenti verso il target di opinione dato, codifichiamo efficacemente le informazioni di destinazione nel nostro modello con la rappresentazione consapevole del target. I risultati empirici dimostrano che il nostro modello supera significativamente tutti i modelli esistenti su quattro set di dati benchmark. Un'analisi approfondita dimostra anche l'efficacia di ogni componente dei nostri modelli. Il nostro codice è disponibile all'indirizzo https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.", 'mk': 'Ориентирано на целта зборовите на мислење екстракција (TOWE) е подпрашање на аспектна анализа на чувства (ABSA). It aims to extract the corresponding opinion words for a given opinion target in a review sentence.  Интуитивно, односот помеѓу целта на мислењето и зборот на мислењето најчесто зависи од синтактика. Во оваа студија, дизајнираме директивен граф на синтактичка зависност базиран на дрво на зависност за да поставиме пат од целта до кандидатските мислења. Subsequently, we propose a novel attention-based relational graph convolutional neural network (ARGCN) to exploit syntactic information over dependency graphs.  Покрај тоа, за експлицитно да ги извадиме соодветните зборови на мислењето кон дадената цел на мислење, ние ефикасно ги кодираме целните информации во нашиот модел со претставување на цел-свесно. Империските резултати покажуваат дека нашиот модел значително ги надминува сите постоечки модели на четири бази на податоци. Екстензивната анализа, исто така, ја покажува ефективноста на секој компонент на нашите модели. Нашиот код е достапен на https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'ms': 'Pengekstrak perkataan pendapat oriented sasaran (TOWE) adalah subtanya analisis sentimen berdasarkan aspek (ABSA). Ia bertujuan untuk mengekstrak perkataan pendapat yang sepadan untuk sasaran pendapat tertentu dalam kalimat ulasan. Secara intuitif, hubungan antara sasaran pendapat dan perkataan pendapat kebanyakan bergantung pada sintaktik. Dalam kajian ini, kami merancang graf dependensi sintaktik direksi berdasarkan pokok dependensi untuk menetapkan laluan dari sasaran ke pendapat calon. Kemudian, kami cadangkan rangkaian saraf konvolusi graf hubungan berbasis perhatian yang baru (ARGCN) untuk mengeksploitasi maklumat sintaktik melalui graf dependensi. Selain itu, untuk mengekstrak secara eksplicit perkataan pendapat yang sepadan ke arah sasaran pendapat yang diberikan, kita secara efektif mengekodkan maklumat sasaran dalam model kita dengan perwakilan sasaran-sedar. Keputusan empirik menunjukkan bahawa model kita jauh melebihi semua model yang wujud pada empat set data benchmark. Analisis luas juga menunjukkan kegunaan setiap komponen model kita. Kod kita tersedia di https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'kk': 'Мақсатты мәліметтің сөздерін тарқату (TOWE) аспекті негіздеген сезімдер анализиясының (ABSA) астық сұрауы. Бұл келтірілген мәліметтің мақсатына сәйкес сөздерін қарау үшін шығару мақсатында. Көрініс мақсаттың арасындағы қатынасы мен ойлау сөзі көбінде синтактикаларға тәуелді. Бұл зерттеулерде, кандидаттарға жолды құру үшін синтактикалық тәуелдік графикасын құрамыз. Содан кейін, біз жаңа қатынасыз негізінде қатынасыз график конволюциялық невралдық желі (ARGCN) синтактикалық мәліметті тәуелдік графикалық графикалық графикалық графикалық үшін қолдан Қосымша, келтірілген санау мақсатына сәйкес сөздерді таңдау үшін, мақсатты мәліметтеріміздің үлгімізде мақсатты түсініктемесімен кодтамыз. Эмпериялық нәтижелер үлгіміздің төрт белгілер деректер қорларында барлық үлгілерді өзгертуге көмектеседі. Кеңейтілген анализ мұндай-ақ үлгілердің әрбір компонентінің эффектілігін көрсетеді. Біздің кодмыз бар https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'lt': 'Tikslinės nuomonės žodžiai ekstrahavimas (TOWE) yra aspektais pagrįstos jautrumo analizės (ABSA) paklausa. Jame siekiama peržiūros sakinyje išbraukti atitinkamus nuomonės žodžius konkrečiam nuomonės tikslui. Intuityviai santykis tarp nuomonės tikslo ir nuomonės žodžio daugiausia grindžiamas sintaktika. Šiame tyrime sukuriame nukreiptą sintaksinę priklausomybės grafiką, grindžiamą priklausomybės medžiu, kad nustatytume kelią nuo tikslo iki kandidatų nuomonių. Subsequently, we propose a novel attention-based relational graph convolutional neural network (ARGCN) to exploit syntactic information over dependency graphs.  Moreover, to explicitly extract the corresponding opinion words toward the given opinion target, we effectively encode target information in our model with the target-aware representation.  Imperijos rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų modelis gerokai viršija visus esamus modelius keturiuose lyginamuosiuose duomenų rinkiniuose. Išsami analizė taip pat rodo kiekvieno mūsų modelių komponento veiksmingumą. Mūsų kodas pateikiamas https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'ml': 'ലക്ഷ്യത്തിലേക്കുള്ള അഭിപ്രായത്തിന്റെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നത് (TOWE) ഭാഗ്യത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ അനുഭവങ് അതിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം ഒരു പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട അഭിപ്രായ വാക്കുകള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കാനാണ്. ഒരു അഭിപ്രായത്തിന്\u200dറെ ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്\u200dറെയും ഒരു അഭിപ്രായത്തിന്\u200dറെയും തമ്മിലുള്ള ബന്ധം മിക്കവാറും സിന്\u200dടാക ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നേര്\u200dവഴിയിലുള്ള സിന്\u200dടാക്റ്റിക്ക് ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന ഗ്രാഫ് സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു. ലക്ഷ്യത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും പ അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവലിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള ബന്ധുക്കളുടെ ഗ്രാഫ് പരിശോധിക്കുന്നുണ്ട്. കുഴപ്പത്തിലുള്ള നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d  അതുകൊണ്ടും, നമ്മുടെ ലക്ഷ്യത്തിലെ ലക്ഷ്യത്തില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്\u200dറെ ലക്ഷ്യത്തില്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ മോഡലില്\u200d വ് നാല് ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡേറ്റാസ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d നില്\u200dക്കുന്ന എല്ലാ മോഡലുകളെയും പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു എന്ന് നമ്മു വിശാലമായ അന്വേഷണം നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ എല്ലാ ഭാഗത്തിന്റെയും പ്രഭാവം കാണിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ കോഡ് ലഭ്യമാണ് https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'mn': 'Цагаан дахь ойлголтын үг (TOWE) гэдэг нь асуудлын үндсэн сэтгэл санааны шинжилгээ (ABSA) юм. Үүний зорилго нь шүүмжлэх өгүүлбэрээр өгөгдсөн санааны зорилго дээр харьцуулсан санааны үгийг нэмэгдүүлэх зорилго юм. Үнэндээ, санааны зорилго болон санааны үг хоорондын харилцаа ихэнхдээ синтактикт хамааралтай. Энэ судалгаанд бид загвараас хамааралтай модны үндсэн синтактикийн хамааралтай график бүтээж, зорилготой санаанууд руу зам зохион байгуулахын тулд зорилготой. Дараагийн дараа бид анхаарлын үндсэн харилцааны график (ARGCN) хувьд хамааралтай график дээр синтактик мэдээллийг ашиглах гэж шинэ санал өгдөг. Дараа нь, бид санааны зорилго руу харьцуулсан санааны үгсийг тодорхой нэмэгдүүлэхэд зорилготой мэдээллийг загвараар зорилготой мэдээллийг загвараар шинэчлэх хэрэгтэй. Эзэмшигийн үр дүнд бидний загвар дөрвөн багц өгөгдлийн санд байгаа бүх загваруудыг үнэхээр үр дүнтэй болгодог гэдгийг харуулж байна. Мөн өргөн шинжилгээ нь бидний загварын бүх компонентийн үр дүнг харуулдаг. Бидний код нь https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'mt': "Target-oriented opinion words extraction (TOWE) is a subtask of aspect-based sentiment analysis (ABSA).  Hija għandha l-għan li testrakta l-kliem korrispondenti tal-opinjoni għal mira partikolari tal-opinjoni f’sentenza ta’ reviżjoni. Intwittivament, ir-relazzjoni bejn mira tal-opinjoni u kelma tal-opinjoni tiddependi l-aktar fuq is-sintattiċi. F’dan l-istudju, a ħna niddisinjaw graff ta’ dipendenza sintattika dirett ibbażat fuq siġar ta’ dipendenza biex jistabbilixxu triq mill-mira għall-opinjonijiet kandidati. Sussegwentement, qed nipproponu netwerk newrali konvoluzzjonali ta' graff relattiv ġdid ibbażat fuq l-attenzjoni (ARGCN) biex tiġi sfruttata l-informazzjoni sintattika fuq graffi tad-dipendenza. Barra minn hekk, biex jiġu estratti b’mod espliċitu l-kliem tal-opinjoni korrispondenti lejn il-mira tal-opinjoni mogħtija, aħna effettivament inkodifikaw l-informazzjoni fil-mira fil-mudell tagħna bir-rappreżentanza konxja tal-mira. Ir-riżultati empiriċi juru li l-mudell tagħna jaqbeż b’mod sinifikanti l-mudelli eżistenti kollha fuq erba’ settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ referenza. Analiżi estensiva turi wkoll l-effettività ta’ kull komponent tal-mudelli tagħna. Il-kodiċi tagħna huwa disponibbli fuq https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.", 'no': 'Ekstraksjon av målorienterte opplysningsord (TOWE) er ein subtspørsmål av aspektbasert sentimentanalyse (ABSA). Det måtar å pakka ut dei tilsvarande tankefordene for eit gjeven meningsmål i eit oversiktsetning. Intuitivt er forandringen mellom eit mål og eit opplysningsord hovudsakelig på syntaktikk. I denne studien designerer vi ein direkte syntaksisk avhengighetsgraf basert på ein avhengighetstrå for å oppretta ein bane frå målet til kandidat-opinionar. I tillegg foreslår vi eit nytt oppmerksomhetsbasert relasjonsgraf konvolusjonell neuralnettverk (ARGCN) for å bruka syntaksisk informasjon over avhengighetsgrafene. For å eksplisisere dei tilsvarande meningsord mot den oppgjevne meningsmålet, koder vi effektivt målsinformasjonen i modellen vårt med representasjonen med målskjerne. Empirical results demonstrate that our model significantly outperforms all the existing models on four benchmark datasets. Ekstra analyse viser også effektiviteten av kvar komponent av våre modeller. Koden vårt er tilgjengeleg på https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'pl': 'Ekstrakcja słów opinii celowej (TOWE) jest podzadaniem analizy sentymentów opartej na aspektach (ABSA). Ma on na celu wyodrębnienie odpowiednich słów opinii dla danego celu opinii w zdaniu przeglądowym. Intuicyjnie relacja między celem opinii a słowem opinii opiera się głównie na składni. W niniejszym opracowaniu projektujemy ukierunkowany wykres składni zależności oparty na drzewie zależności, aby ustalić ścieżkę od docelowej do opinii kandydatów. Następnie proponujemy nowatorską sieć neuronową opartą na uwadze (ARGCN) w celu wykorzystania informacji składniowych na wykresach zależności. Ponadto, aby wyraźnie wyodrębnić odpowiednie słowa opinii wobec danego celu opinii, skutecznie kodujemy informacje docelowe w naszym modelu z reprezentacją docelową. Wyniki empiryczne pokazują, że nasz model znacznie przewyższa wszystkie istniejące modele na czterech zbiorach danych referencyjnych. Obszerna analiza pokazuje również skuteczność każdego składnika naszych modeli. Nasz kod jest dostępny pod adresem: https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'ro': 'Extracția cuvintelor de opinie orientate spre țintă (TOWE) este o subactivitate a analizei sentimentului bazate pe aspecte (ABSA). Acesta urmărește extragerea cuvintelor de aviz corespunzătoare pentru un anumit obiectiv de aviz într-o propoziție de revizuire. Intuitiv, relatia dintre un obiectiv de opinie si un cuvant de opinie se bazeaza in mare parte pe sintactica. În acest studiu, proiectăm un grafic de dependență sintactică direcționat bazat pe un arbore de dependență pentru a stabili o cale de la țintă la opiniile candidate. Ulterior, propunem o nouă rețea neuronală convoluțională a graficului relațional bazată pe atenție (ARGCN) pentru a exploata informația sintactică peste graficele de dependență. Mai mult decât atât, pentru a extrage explicit cuvintele de opinie corespunzătoare spre obiectivul de opinie dat, codăm eficient informațiile țintă în modelul nostru cu reprezentarea țintă conștientă de țintă. Rezultatele empirice demonstrează că modelul nostru depășește semnificativ toate modelele existente pe patru seturi de date de referință. Analiza extinsă demonstrează, de asemenea, eficiența fiecărei componente a modelelor noastre. Codul nostru este disponibil la https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'si': 'ලක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරධාන විශ්වාසය (TOWE) වචනය ප්\u200dරධාන විශ්ලේෂණය (ABSA) ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. ඒක අදහස් කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වාර්තාවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයෙන්, හිතන්නේ ඉලක්කයක් අතර සම්බන්ධය සහ හිතන්නේ වචනයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය විදිහට සංවේදනය වි මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, අපි ප්\u200dරධානයක් සංවිධානයක් සංවිධානයක් සංවිධානය කරන්නේ අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් ගස්සක් අධිර්ථ ඊට පස්සේ, අපි නියම අවධානය සම්බන්ධ ග්\u200dරාෆ් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදි ඒවගේම, ප්\u200dරශ්නයෙන්ම සම්බන්ධ විශ්වාසයෙන් පිළිබඳින්න අදහසක් වචන් දෙන්න තියෙන්නේ අදහසක් ලක්ෂණයෙන්, අප ඉම්පිරිකාලික ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වනවා අපේ මොඩල් විශේෂයෙන් සියළුම මොඩල් හතරක් විසින් ප්\u200dරතිචාරය විස්තර විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මෝඩල් එක්කෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. අපේ කෝඩ් එක පුළුවන් https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'sr': 'Ekstrakcija reèi na cilju orientisane mišljenje (TOWE) je podpitanje analize sentiment a na aspektu (ABSA). Cilj je da izvuče odgovarajuće mišljenje reči za određenu cilj mišljenja u presudi za pregled. Intuitivno, odnos između cilja mišljenja i reč mišljenja uglavnom se oslanja na sintaktičku metodu. U ovoj studiji, dizajniramo direktni grafik sintaktičke zavisnosti na osnovu drveta zavisnosti da uspostavimo put od cilja do mišljenja kandidata. Nakon toga predlažemo novu veznu grafiku na pažnji konvolucionalnu neuralnu mrežu (ARGCN) da iskoristi sintaktičnu informaciju o graficima zavisnosti. Osim toga, da bismo izrazili odgovarajuće riječi mišljenja prema određenom cilju mišljenja, efikasno kodiramo ciljne informacije u našem modelu sa predstavljanjem svjesnog cilja. Impirički rezultati pokazuju da naš model značajno iznosi sve postojeće modele na četiri standardna seta podataka. Ekstensivna analiza takođe pokazuje učinkovitost svakog komponenta našeg modela. Naš kod je dostupan na https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'sv': 'Target-oriented opinion words extraction (TOWE) är en underuppgift för aspektbaserad sentimental analys (ABSA). Den syftar till att extrahera motsvarande yttrandeord för ett visst yttrandemål i en översyn mening. Intuitivt sett bygger relationen mellan ett opinionsmål och ett opinionsord mestadels på syntaktik. I denna studie utformar vi en riktad syntaktisk beroendegraf baserad på ett beroendeträd för att etablera en väg från målet till kandidatens åsikter. Därefter föreslår vi ett nytt uppmärksamhetsbaserat relationsgraf convolutional neural network (ARGCN) för att utnyttja syntaktisk information över beroendegrafer. Dessutom, för att uttryckligen extrahera motsvarande opinionsord mot det givna opinionsmålet, kodar vi effektivt målinformation i vår modell med den målmedvetna representationen. Empiriska resultat visar att vår modell avsevärt överträffar alla befintliga modeller på fyra referensdatauppsättningar. Omfattande analys visar också effektiviteten hos varje komponent i våra modeller. Vår kod finns tillgänglig på https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'ta': 'இலக்கு- சார்ந்த கருத்து வார்த்தைகள் பிரித்தல் (TOWE) ஒரு பகுதியில் அடிப்படையான உணர்வு ஆராய்ச்சி( ABSA). கொடுக்கப்பட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட கருத்து குறிப்பிட்ட வாக்கியத்திற்கான ஒத்திசைப்படையான கருத்து வார் ஒரு கருத்து இலக்கு மற்றும் ஒரு கருத்து வார்த்தையின் இடையே தொடர்பு பெரும்பாலாக ஒத்திசைப்படை சார்ந்து இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், நாம் ஒரு நேர்வழி சார்ந்த சார்பு வரைப்படத்தை வடிவமைக்கிறோம் சார்ந்த கருத்துக்களை சார்ந்து சார்ந்த பின்னர், நாம் ஒரு புதிய கவனத்தை அடிப்படையான தொடர்பு வரைப்படத்தின் சார்ந்த புதிய பிணையத்தின் வலைப்பின்னலை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். ச கொடுக்கப்பட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட கருத்து சேர்க்கையின் சொல்லை வெளியேற்ற வேண்டுமானால், எங்கள் மாதிரியில் இலக்கு தகவலை வெளியீட எம்பிரியல் முடிவு விரிவான ஆய்வு நமது மாதிரிகளின் ஒவ்வொரு பொருளின் விளைவை காண்பிக்கிறது. எங்கள் குறியீடு கிடைக்கும் https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'ur': 'Target-oriented opinion words extraction (TOWE) is a subtask of aspect-based sentiment analysis (ABSA). اس کا ارادہ یہ ہے کہ ایک دوسرے منظور کے موقع کے لئے مطابق نظر کے کلمات نکالیں. بغیر معلوم، نظر کا موقع اور نظر کا کلمہ اکثر سینٹیکٹیک پر اعتماد ہے. اس تحقیقات میں، ہم ایک سینٹاکتیک اعتباری گراف طراحی کرتے ہیں جو ایک مستقل درخت پر بنیاد رکھتا ہے تاکہ موقع سے ایک راستہ مقرر کرنے کے لئے کاندینڈیٹ نظر تک بنائیں. اس کے بعد، ہم نے ایک نوی توجه کی بنیادی گراف کی رابطہ داری نئورل نیٹورک (ARGCN) کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ اعتباری گراف پر سینٹکتیک معلومات استعمال کریں. اس کے علاوہ، ہم نے اپنے مدل میں موجود معلومات کو موجود معلومات کے ذریعہ سمجھنے کے مطابق مطابق نظر کے کلمات نکالنے کے لئے، موجود معلومات کے ساتھ موجود ہے. عمومی نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری مدل چار بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ پر تمام موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود ہیں۔ اور ہمارے نمڈلوں کی ہر قسمت کا اثرات دکھاتا ہے۔ ہمارا کوڈ اس میں موجود ہے https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'so': 'ABSA waa baaritaanka aragtida (TOWE). Waxaa loogu talogalay in uu soo bixiyo hadallada aragtida oo isku mid ah oo uu ku qoro hagitaan aragtida oo lagu qoray qoraal baaritaanka ah. Xiriirka la xiriira goalka aragtida iyo hadalka aragnimadu inta badan waxay ku xiran tahay isku-qabsiga. Waxbarashadan waxaynu ku qoraynaa xarunta hagitaan oo ku saabsan geed xiriirta ah si aan uga dhisno wado xagga goalka iyo fikirrada kandida ah. Markaas waxaynu soo jeedaynaa shabakadda xiriirka ee warqada ah oo ku saleysan xarunta qoyska kooxaha ah (ARGCN) si aan ugu baaraano macluumaadka syntactic oo ku saabsan graphicyada ku xiran. Sidoo kale si bayaan ah ugu soo bixino hadallada aragtida oo ku habboon xagga hagitaanka aragtida, waxaynu si faa’iido ah ugu qornaa macluumaadka kaalmeynta ee noogu qoran qaababka qaabilsan. Shaqo la’aanta waxay muujiyaan in modellkayagu aad buu u muujiyaa dhammaan modellada joogta oo dhan oo ku yaal afar bangmooyinka. Extensive analysis also demonstrates the effectiveness of each component of our models.  Aqoontayada waxaa laga helaa https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'uz': "Tarkibi fikr so'zlarini ajratish (TOWE) aspekt asosida sentiment analyzeri (ABSA) bir vazifa. Koʻrsatilgan ifodalar maqsadiga qisqa so'zlarni koʻchirish mumkin. Ko'pchilik fikrlarning hamma narsa va fikr so'zlari qo'shimcha tizimga ishlatadi. Bu taʼminotda, biz tashkilotni tasdiqlash uchun qo'shilga tashkilotni tasavvur qilamiz. Keyin biz murakkablik tarmoq (ARGCN) bilan bog'liq murakkablik tarmoqni foydalanishimiz uchun qoʻshimcha tarmoqni qo'llanmalamiz. Ko'rsatilgan fikrlarni ko'rsatish uchun, biz foydalanuvchimiz modelimizda foydalanuvchi maʼlumot yordamida foydalanishimiz mumkin. Empirical results demonstrate that our model significantly outperforms all of the existing models on four benchmark datasets.  Koʻproq analytik modellarimizning har bir qismining effektini ko'rsatadi. Kodlash usuli https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.", 'vi': 'Ý kiến tập kết (TOWE) là một yêu cầu phân tích cảm xúc dựa trên khía cạnh (ABSA). Mục đích của nó là trích xuất từ ý kiến tương ứng với một mục tiêu đưa ra ý kiến trong một bản tóm tắt. Trực giác, quan hệ giữa một mục tiêu ý kiến và một từ ý kiến hầu hết phụ thuộc vào cấu trúc. Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi thiết kế một đồ thị phụ thuộc cú pháp hướng dẫn dựa trên một thân cây để thiết lập một con đường từ mục tiêu đến ý kiến ứng cử viên. Sau đó, chúng tôi đề xuất một mạng lưới dây thần kinh liên quan quan quan dựa trên sự chú ý (ARGCN) để khai thác thông tin đồng pháp hơn các đồ thị phụ thuộc. Thêm vào đó, để trích các từ ý kiến tương ứng vào mục tiêu đưa ra ý kiến, chúng tôi thực sự mã hóa thông tin tiêu trong mô hình với các mô tả nhận thức mục tiêu. Những kết quả của công nghệ chứng minh rằng mô hình của chúng ta khả năng vượt trội hơn tất cả các mô- đun đã có trên bốn tập tin mẫu. Sự phân tích đầy đủ cũng chứng minh hiệu quả của mỗi thành phần của mô hình. Mật mã của chúng tôi có sẵn ở https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'bg': 'Извличането на целенасочени думи на мнение (ТОВЕ) е подзадача на анализ на сентименталността (АБСА). Тя има за цел да извлече съответните думи на мнение за дадена цел на мнение в изречение за преразглеждане. Интуитивно връзката между цел на мнение и дума на мнение разчита най-вече на синтактика. В това проучване ние проектираме насочена синтактична графика на зависимост, базирана на дърво на зависимостта, за да установим път от целевите към кандидатските мнения. Впоследствие, ние предлагаме нова базирана на вниманието релационна графика конволюционна невронна мрежа (ARGCN) за експлоатиране на синтактична информация над зависими графики. Освен това, за да извлечем изрично съответните думи на мнение към дадената цел на мнението, ние ефективно кодираме целевата информация в нашия модел с представяне, осъзнаващо целта. Емпиричните резултати показват, че нашият модел значително превъзхожда всички съществуващи модели на четири сравнителни набора данни. Обширният анализ също показва ефективността на всеки компонент на нашите модели. Нашият код е достъпен на адрес: https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'da': 'Target-oriented opinion words extraction (TOWE) er en underopgave af aspektbaseret sentiment analyse (ABSA). Den har til formål at udtrække de tilsvarende meningsord for et givet meningsmål i en revideret sætning. Intuitivt set afhænger forholdet mellem et meningsmål og et meningsord hovedsageligt af syntaktik. I denne undersøgelse designer vi en målrettet syntaktisk afhængighedsgraf baseret på et afhængighedstræ for at etablere en sti fra målet til kandidatens meninger. Efterfølgende foreslår vi en ny opmærksomhedsbaseret relationsgraf convolutional neural network (ARGCN) til at udnytte syntaktisk information over afhængighedsgrafer. For eksplicit at udtrække de tilsvarende meningsord til det givne meningsmål, koder vi effektivt måloplysninger i vores model med den målbevidste repræsentation. Empiriske resultater viser, at vores model overgår alle de eksisterende modeller på fire benchmark datasæt betydeligt. Omfattende analyse viser også effektiviteten af hver komponent i vores modeller. Vores kode er tilgængelig på https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'nl': 'Target-oriented opinion words extraction (TOWE) is een subtaak van aspect-based sentiment analysis (ABSA). Het doel is om de overeenkomstige opiniewoorden voor een bepaald opiniedoel in een beoordelingssaal te extraheren. Intuïtief is de relatie tussen een opiniedoel en een opiniewoord meestal gebaseerd op syntactiek. In dit onderzoek ontwerpen we een gerichte syntactische afhankelijkheidsgrafiek op basis van een afhankelijkheidsboom om een pad te bepalen van het doel naar kandidaat opinies. Vervolgens stellen we een nieuw attentie-based relational graph convolutional neural network (ARGCN) voor om syntactische informatie over afhankelijkheidsgrafieken te exploiteren. Bovendien coderen we doelinformatie effectief in ons model met de doelbewuste representatie om de overeenkomstige opiniewoorden expliciet te extraheren naar het gegeven opiniedoel. Empirische resultaten tonen aan dat ons model aanzienlijk beter presteert dan alle bestaande modellen op vier benchmark datasets. Uitgebreide analyse toont ook de effectiviteit van elk onderdeel van onze modellen aan. Onze code is beschikbaar op https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'hr': 'Ekstrakcija riječi na cilj orientirane mišljenje (TOWE) je podpitanje analize osjećaja na aspektu (ABSA). Cilj je izvući odgovarajuće riječi mišljenja za određenu cilj mišljenja u kazni za pregled. Intuitivno, odnos između cilja mišljenja i riječ mišljenja uglavnom se oslanja na sintaktiku. U ovom ispitivanju dizajniramo direktni grafik sintaktičke zavisnosti na temelju drveta zavisnosti kako bi uspostavili put od cilja do mišljenja kandidata. Nakon toga predlažemo novu veznu grafiku na pažnji konvolucionalnu neuralnu mrežu (ARGCN) kako bi iskoristili sintaktične informacije o graficima ovisnosti. Osim toga, kako bismo izrazili odgovarajuće riječi mišljenja prema određenom cilju mišljenja, efektivno kodiramo ciljne informacije u našem modelu s predstavljanjem svjesnog cilja. Empirički rezultati pokazuju da naš model značajno nadmašuje sve postojeće modele na četiri standardna seta podataka. Proširena analiza također pokazuje učinkovitost svakog komponenta našeg modela. Naš kod je dostupan na https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'de': 'Die zielgerichtete Meinungswortextraktion (TOWE) ist eine Teilaufgabe der aspect-based sentiment analysis (ABSA). Es zielt darauf ab, die entsprechenden Meinungsworte für ein bestimmtes Meinungsziel in einem Übersichtssatz zu extrahieren. Intuitiv basiert die Beziehung zwischen einem Meinungsziel und einem Meinungswort meist auf Syntaktik. In dieser Studie entwerfen wir ein gerichtetes syntaktisches Abhängigkeitsdiagramm basierend auf einem Abhängigkeitsbaum, um einen Pfad von der Zielmeinung zu den Kandidatenminuitäten festzulegen. Anschließend schlagen wir ein neuartiges aufmerksamkeitsbasiertes relationales Graphenconvolutional neuronal network (ARGCN) vor, um syntaktische Informationen über Abhängigkeitsdiagramme auszunutzen. Um die entsprechenden Meinungsworte explizit in Richtung des gegebenen Meinungsziels zu extrahieren, kodieren wir Zielinformationen effektiv in unserem Modell mit der zielbewussten Darstellung. Empirische Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Modell alle bestehenden Modelle auf vier Benchmark-Datensätzen deutlich übertrifft. Umfangreiche Analysen belegen auch die Wirksamkeit jeder Komponente unserer Modelle. Unser Code ist verfügbar unter https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'id': 'Kata-kata pendapat orientiran sasaran (TOWE) adalah subtask dari analisis sentimen berdasarkan aspek (ABSA). Hal ini bermaksud untuk mengekstrak kata-kata pendapat yang cocok untuk sasaran pendapat tertentu dalam kalimat penelitian. Intuisif, hubungan antara sasaran pendapat dan kata pendapat kebanyakan bergantung pada sintaksi. In this study, we design a directed syntactic dependency graph based on a dependency tree to establish a path from the target to candidate opinions.  Kemudian, kami mengusulkan sebuah grafik relatif berbasis perhatian yang baru jaringan neural konvolusi (ARGCN) untuk mengeksploitasi informasi sintaksi melalui grafik dependensi. Selain itu, untuk secara eksplisit mengekstrak kata-kata pendapat yang sesuai menuju target pendapat yang diberikan, kita secara efektif mengkode informasi sasaran dalam model kita dengan representation yang sadar target. Hasil kerajaan menunjukkan bahwa model kita jauh melebihi semua model yang ada pada empat set data benchmark. Analisi ekstensif juga menunjukkan efektivitas setiap komponen dari model kita. Kode kita tersedia di https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'fa': 'استخراج کلمات نظر هدف (TOWE) از تحلیل احساسات بر اساس نقطه (ABSA) است. هدف این است که کلمات نظر متفاوتی را برای هدف نظر داده در یک مجازات بازرسی خارج کند. ارتباط بین یک هدف نظر و یک کلمه نظر بیشتر بر سنتاکتیک بستگی دارد. در این مطالعه، ما یک گراف بستگی سنتاکتیک راهنمایی را طراحی می کنیم که بر اساس یک درخت بستگی است تا مسیری از هدف به نظر کاندیداتی ایجاد کند. بعدش، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک گراف رابطه\u200cای بر روی توجه جدید شبکه عصبی (ARGCN) برای استفاده از اطلاعات سنتاکتیک بر گراف بستگی. علاوه بر این، برای اینکه کلمات نظر مشترک را به سمت هدف نظر داده خارج کنیم، ما به طور تاثیر اطلاعات هدف را در مدل خودمان با نمایش شناختن هدف رمز کنیم. نتایج امپراطوری نشان می دهد که مدل ما به طور معنی تمام مدل موجود را بر چهار مجموعه داده\u200cهای سنجیر انجام می\u200cدهد. تحلیل گسترده\u200cای همچنین فعالیت هر بخش مدل\u200cهای ما را نشان می\u200cدهد. کد ما در دسترس است https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'ko': '목표를 향한 관점어 추출(TOWE)은 측면에 기초한 감정 분석(ABSA)의 하위 임무이다.그것의 목적은 문장을 복습하여 주어진 관점 목표를 위해 상응하는 관점어를 추출하는 것이다.직각적으로 관점 목표와 관점어 간의 관계는 주로 문법에 의존한다.본 연구에서 우리는 의존 트리를 바탕으로 하는 유방향 문법 의존도를 설계하여 목표에서 후보 관점까지의 경로를 세웠다.그 다음에 우리는 주의에 기반한 새로운 관계도 권적신경망(ARGCN)을 제시하여 의존도상의 문법 정보를 이용했다.그 밖에 주어진 의견 목표에 대해 상응하는 의견어를 명확하게 추출하기 위해 우리는 모델에서 목표 감지를 사용하여 목표 정보를 효과적으로 인코딩했다.실증 결과에 의하면 네 개의 기준 데이터 집합에서 우리의 모델은 모든 기존 모델보다 현저히 우수하다.광범위한 분석도 우리 모델의 모든 구성 부분의 유효성을 증명했다.우리 코드는https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'sw': 'Uchaguzi wa maneno ya maoni yenye lengo (TOWE) ni jukumu la uchambuzi wa hisia inayohusiana na mtazamo (ABSA). It aims to extract the corresponding opinion words for a given opinion target in a review sentence.  Kwa ujumla, uhusiano kati ya lengo la maoni na neno la maoni huwa linategemea kwa pamoja. Katika utafiti huu, tunaunda picha inayoelekezwa kutegemea muungano unaotegemea na mti wa kutegemea ili kutengeneza njia kutoka kwa lengo hilo mpaka maoni ya wagombea. Baadae, tunapendekeza mtandao wa picha inayohusiana na riwaya inayohusiana na mahusiano (ARGCN) ili kutumia taarifa za ushirikiano juu ya picha za kutegemea. Zaidi ya hayo, ili kuondoa wazi maneno yanayojibu kwa lengo la maoni, tunaweka taarifa za malengo katika mtindo wetu na uwakilishi wa malengo yanayofahamika. Matokeo ya msisimu yanaonyesha kuwa mifano yetu inaonyesha kwa kiasi kikubwa mifano yote iliyopo kwenye seti nne za benchmark. Uchambuzi wa kina pia unaonyesha ufanisi wa kila sehemu ya mifano yetu. Utawala wetu unapatikana katika https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'tr': 'G철rn체힊de g철rn체힊 pikir s철zleri 챌ykarmak (TOWE) aspekt-tarapyndan da힊ary du첵gular analyzasyny흫 alty soragy. Bu d체힊체n첵채n s철zlerini g철zlemek 체챌in berilen d체힊체n첵채n maksady 챌ykarmak maksady. D체힊체n챌 maksady we pikir s철z체흫 arasyny흫 bagla힊yky k철plen챌 sintaktiklere ynan첵ar. Bu ara힊dyrmada, kandidy흫 s철zlerine bir 첵oly gurmak 체챌in, da힊arylyk agajynda da첵an첵an bir syntaktik baglan힊yk grafiki tasarlandyrys. Sonras캇nda, ba휓l캇l캇k grafiklerinde sintaktik bilgi kullanmak i챌in yeni ilgin챌 grafiklere ba휓l캇 bir temas teklif ediyoruz. Mundan so흫ra, d체힊체n첵채n s철zleri berilen d체힊체n첵채n maksada tarapyna a챌mak 체챌in, biz nusgadymyzda maksady maglumatlary gola첵y bilen kodla첵arys. Wagtla첵yn netijesi bizi흫 modelimiz d철rt benchmark veri setirlerinde 채hli bar modelleri흫 체st체ni 챌ykar첵andygyny g철rkez. D철wletlerimiz modelleri흫 her komponenti흫 t채sirini hem g철rkez첵채r. Bizi흫 kodymyz bar https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'af': "Teël-orienteerde besonderhede woorde uitvoer (TOWE) is 'n subtvraag van aspekt-gebaseerde sentimentanalisie (ABSA). Dit doel doen om die ooreenstemmende besonderhede woorde vir 'n gegewe besonderhede doel in' n oorskou seting te uitpak. Intuitief, die verwanting tussen 'n besonderhede doel en 'n besonderhede woord meeste op sintaktika aflyk. In hierdie studie ontwerp ons 'n direkte sintakteel afhanklikheidsgraf gebaseer op 'n afhanklikheidsboom om 'n pad te stel van die doel van kandidate besonderhede. Ons voorstel daarna 'n nuwe aandag-gebaseerde relasionele graf konvolusionele neuralnetwerk (ARGCN) om sintakteel inligting oor afhanklikheidsgrafe te gebruik. Ook, om die ooreenstemmende besonderhede woorde na die gegewe besonderhede doel te uitpak, ons kodeer effektief doel inligting in ons model met die doel-bewyse voorsiening. Enige resultate wys dat ons model betekeurig uitvoer al die bestaande modele op vier benchmark datastelle. Ekstensiewe analisie bevestig ook die effektiviteit van elke komponent van ons modele. Ons kode is beskikbaar by https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.", 'sq': 'Fjalët e opinionit të orientuar në objektiv (TOWE) janë një nënpyetje e analizës së ndjenjave bazuar në aspekte (ABSA). Ajo synon të nxjerrë fjalët e opinionit korrespondent për një objektiv të caktuar të opinionit në një dënim përmbledhjeje. Intuitivisht, marrëdhënia midis një objektivi të opinionit dhe një fjale të opinionit mbështetet kryesisht në sintaktikë. Në këtë studim, ne dizajnojmë një grafik të drejtuar të varësisë sintaktike bazuar në një dru të varësisë për të vendosur një rrugë nga objektivi në opinionet kandidate. Më pas, ne propozojmë një rrjet nervor konvolutiv (ARGCN) lidhur me një grafik të ri lidhur me vëmendjen për të shfrytëzuar informacionin sintaktik lidhur me grafikët e varësisë. Përveç kësaj, për të nxjerrë shprehësisht fjalët e opinionit korrespondentë drejt objektivit të caktuar të opinionit, ne efektivisht kodojmë informacionin objektiv në model in tonë me përfaqësimin e ndërgjegjshëm për objektivin. Rezultatet imperiale demonstrojnë se modeli ynë mbivlerëson në mënyrë të konsiderueshme të gjitha modelet ekzistuese në katër baza të dhënash. Analiza e gjerë tregon gjithashtu efektshmërinë e çdo komponenti të modeleve tona. Kodi ynë është në dispozicion në https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'am': 'የጎዳና አየር ቃላት አቀማመጥ (TOWE) የፊደል ስሜት አዳራሽ (ABSA) ነው፡፡ በተመለከተው ፍርድ ላይ የተሰኘውን የቆጣጠር ቃላት ለማውጣት ይችላል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የቆጣጠር አካባቢ እና አስተያየት ቃል መካከል ግንኙነት አብዛኛውን በተስማማሚ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት፣ በተመሳሳይ ዛፍ ላይ የተመሳሳይ የሲንተርካዊ ጥናት መግለጫ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ የዘላለም የግንኙነት ግንኙነት የነዌብ መረብ (ARGCN) በተደገመ ቀለም ላይ የስናታዊ መረጃ ለመጠቀም እናስጀጋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ በተሰጠው አካባቢ አካባቢ ቃላትን ለመግለጥ እናስፈልጋለን፣ በተቃውሞው መልዕክት እናውቃለን፡፡ የውጤት ውጤቶች ምሳሌያችን በአራቱ benchmark ዳታዎች ላይ የሚኖረውን ሞዴላዎች ሁሉ በሙሉ የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡ የስፋት ምርጫዎች የዓይነታችንን አካባቢ ጥቅም ያሳያል፡፡ የፊደል ቅርጽ https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'hy': 'Նպատակային ուղղությամբ գտնվող կարծիքի բառերը "extraction" (TOWE) ասպեկտներով հիմնված զգացմունքների վերլուծության (ABSA) ենթահարցն է: Այն նպատակում է վերանայման նախադասության մեջ հանել որոշակի կարծիքի նպատակի համապատասխան բառերը: Intuitively, the relation between an opinion target and an opinion word mostly relies on syntactics.  Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք ստեղծում ենք ուղղակի սինտակտիկ կախվածության գրաֆիկ, որը հիմնված է կախվածության ծառի վրա, որպեսզի հաստատենք ուղին նպատակից դեպի թեկնածու կարծիքներ: Հետո մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր ուշադրության վրա հիմնված հարաբերական գրաֆիկի կառուցվածքային նյարդային ցանց (ARGNC) օգտագործելու սինտակտիկ տեղեկատվություն կախվածության գրաֆիկների վրա: Ավելին, որպեսզի բացատրականորեն հանենք համապատասխան կարծիքի բառերը դեպի ներկայացված կարծիքի նպատակը, մենք արդյունավետ կոդավորում ենք նպատակային տեղեկատվությունը մեր մոդելի մեջ նպատակային գիտակցական ներկայացման հետ Իմպիրական արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում է գոյություն ունեցող բոլոր մոդելները չորս համեմատային տվյալների համակարգերի վրա: Մեծ վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս նաև մեր մոդելների յուրաքանչյուր բաղադրամի արդյունավետությունը: Մեր կոդը հասանելի է https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'az': 'Hedef tərəfindən fikirləşdirilmiş sözlər çıxarma (TOWE) aspect-based sentiment analizi (ABSA) altı sorğudur. Bu məqsəd müəyyən edilmiş fikirlərin məqsədilə müəyyən edilmiş sözləri çəkmək istəyir. Düşünün məqsədi və fikir sözünün arasındakı bağlantısı çox sintaktiklərə təvəkkül edir. Bu təcrübədə, müvəffəqiyyət a ğacına dayanan bir sintaktik bağımlılıq grafını təyin edirik ki, məqsədindən kandidát fikirlərinə yol qurmaq üçün. Sonra, biz yeni ünvanlı grafik bağlı nöral şəklə (ARGCN) sintaktik məlumatları bağlılıq grafikləri üzərində istifadə etmək üçün yeni bir məlumat təklif edirik. Daha sonra, müəyyən fikirlərin məqsədilə müəyyən edilən fikirlərin sözlərini açıq-aşkar çıxartmaq üçün, məqsədilə məqsədilə məlumat məlumatlarını məqsədilə kodlayırıq. İmpariki sonuçlar göstərir ki, modelimiz dörd benchmark verilənlərin bütün mövcuddur modelləri çox üstün edir. Əlavə analizi də modellərin hər komponentin etkinliğini göstərir. Bizim kodumuz https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'bn': 'উদ্দেশ্যের মুখোমুখি মন্তব্যের কথা বের করা হচ্ছে (টোউই) একটি সাবপ্রতিক ভিত্তিক অনুভূতিবিশ্লেষণ (ABSA)। এটির লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে একটি প্রদত্ত মতামতের লক্ষ্যের জন্য সংশ্লিষ্ট মতামতের কথা বের করার জন্য। যুক্তিভাবে, একটি মতামতের লক্ষ্য এবং একটি মতামতের শব্দের মধ্যে সম্পর্ক বেশীরভাগ সমকামীর উপর নির্ভর করে। এই গবেষণায় আমরা একটি নির্ভরশীল গাছের ভিত্তিতে একটি নির্দেশিত সিন্ট্যাকটিক নির্ভরশীল গ্রাফ ডিজাইন করি যাতে লক্ষ্য থেকে প্রার্থ এর পরে আমরা একটি উপন্যাসের ভিত্তিক পরিচিতি গ্রাফ বিশেষ নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক (আরজিসি) প্রস্তাব করি নির্ভরশীল গ্রাফের বিষয়ে সিন্ট্যাকটিক Moreover, to explicitly extract the corresponding opinion words toward the given opinion target, we effectively encode target information in our model with the target-aware representation.  সম্মানিত ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল চারটি বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটে বিদ্যমান মডেলের প্রতি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ করে। বিস্তারিত বিশ্লেষণ আমাদের মডেলের প্রত্যেক অংশের কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করে। আমাদের কোড পাওয়া যাচ্ছে https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'bs': 'Ekstrakcija riječi na cilj orientirane mišljenje (TOWE) je podpitanje analize osjećaja na aspektu (ABSA). Cilj je izvući odgovarajuće mišljenje riječi za određenu cilj mišljenja u kazni za pregled. Intuitivno, odnos između cilja mišljenja i riječ mišljenja uglavnom se oslanja na sintaktiku. U ovom istraživanju, dizajniramo direktni grafik sintaktičke zavisnosti na temelju drveta zavisnosti kako bi uspostavili put od cilja do mišljenja kandidata. Nakon toga predlažemo novu veznu grafiku na pažnji konvolucionalnu neuralnu mrežu (ARGCN) kako bi iskoristili sintaktične informacije o graficima ovisnosti. Osim toga, da bismo izrazili odgovarajuće riječi mišljenja prema određenom cilju mišljenja, efikasno kodiramo ciljne informacije u našem modelu sa predstavljanjem svjesnog cilja. Empirički rezultati pokazuju da naš model značajno iznosi sve postojeće modele na četiri standardna seta podataka. Provećana analiza također pokazuje učinkovitost svake komponente našeg modela. Naš kod je dostupan na https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'ca': "L'extracció de paraules d'opinió orientades a l'objectiu (TOWE) és una subterrània de l'anàlisi de sentiments basat en aspectes (ABSA). Té l'objectiu d'extrair les paraules d'opinió correspondents per a un objectiu d'opinió determinat en una frase de revisió. Intuïtivament, la relació entre un objectiu d'opinió i una paraula d'opinió es basa principalment en la sinàctica. En aquest estudi, dissenyem un gràfic de dependencia sinàctica orientat basat en un arbre de dependencia per establir un camí de l'objectiu a les opinions candidates. Posteriorment, proposem una nova xarxa neural convolutiva de gràfics relacionals basats en l'atenció (ARGCN) per explotar la informació sinàctica sobre gràfics de dependencia. A més, per extrair explícitament les paraules d'opinió correspondents cap a l'objectiu d'opinió dada, codifiquem efectivament la informació d'objectiu del nostre model amb la representació conscient de l'objectiu. Els resultats empírics demostren que el nostre model supera significativament tots els models existents en quatre conjunts de dades de referència. Una anàlisi extensa també demostra l'efectivitat de cada component dels nostres models. Our code is available at  https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.", 'cs': 'Cílově orientovaná extrakce názorových slov (TOWE) je podúkol aspektově založené analýzy sentimentů (ABSA). Jeho cílem je extrahovat odpovídající názorová slova pro daný cíl názoru v recenzní větě. Intuitivně se vztah mezi cílem názoru a slovem názoru opírá většinou o syntaktiku. V této studii navrhujeme směrovaný syntaktický graf závislosti založený na stromu závislosti, abychom určili cestu od cíle k názorům kandidátů. Následně navrhujeme novou pozornost založenou na relačním grafu konvoluční neuronovou síť (ARGCN) pro využití syntaktických informací nad závislostními grafy. Kromě toho, abychom explicitně extrahovali odpovídající názorová slova k danému názorovému cíli, efektivně kódujeme cílové informace v našem modelu s cílovou reprezentací. Empirické výsledky ukazují, že náš model výrazně předčí všechny existující modely na čtyřech referenčních datových sadách. Rozsáhlá analýza také ukazuje efektivitu každé komponenty našich modelů. Náš kód je k dispozici na adrese https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'et': 'Sihtsuunatud arvamussõnade ekstraheerimine (TOWE) on aspektipõhise sentimentaalüüsi (ABSA) alamülesanne. Selle eesmärk on võtta läbivaatamislausest välja vastavad arvamussõnad konkreetse arvamuse sihtmärgi kohta. Intuitiivselt tugineb arvamuseesmärgi ja arvamussõna suhe peamiselt süntaktikale. Selles uuringus töötame välja suunatud süntaktilise sõltuvuse graafiku, mis põhineb sõltuvuspuul, et määrata tee sihtmärgist kandidaadi arvamusteni. Seejärel pakume välja uue tähelepanupõhise relatsioonigraafiku konvolutsioonivõrgu (ARGCN), et kasutada süntaktilist informatsiooni sõltuvusgraafikute üle. Lisaks sellele, et selgesõnaliselt välja võtta vastavad arvamussõnad antud arvamuse sihtmärgi suunas, kodeerime tulemuslikult sihtmärgi info oma mudelis sihtmärgi teadliku esitusega. Empiirilised tulemused näitavad, et meie mudel ületab oluliselt kõiki olemasolevaid mudeleid neljas võrdlusandmekogumis. Põhjalik analüüs näitab ka meie mudelite iga komponendi tõhusust. Meie kood on kättesaadav aadressil https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'fi': 'Target-oriented opinion words extraction (TOWE) on aspect-based sentiment analysin (ABSA) alatehtävä. Sen tarkoituksena on poimia arviointilauseesta kyseisen lausuntotavoitteen vastaavat mielipiteen sanat. Intuitiivisesti mielipiteen kohteen ja mielipiteen suhde perustuu lähinnä syntaktiikkaan. Tässä työssä suunnittelemme riippuvuuspuun perustuvan suunnatun syntaktisen riippuvuuskaavion, joka luo polun kohderyhmästä ehdokkaiden mielipiteisiin. Tämän jälkeen ehdotamme uutta huomiota perustuvaa relaatiograafisen konvolutionaalisen neuroverkon (ARGCN) hyödyntämistä syntaktisen tiedon hyödyntämiseksi riippuvuuskaavioiden sijaan. Lisäksi, jotta voimme nimenomaisesti poimia vastaavat mielipiteen sanat annettua mielipidetavoitetta kohti, koodaamme tehokkaasti kohdeinformaation malliimme kohdetietoisella edustuksella. Empiiriset tulokset osoittavat, että mallimme suoriutuu merkittävästi kaikista olemassa olevista malleista neljässä vertailuaineistossa. Laaja analyysi osoittaa myös mallien jokaisen komponentin tehokkuuden. Koodimme on saatavilla osoitteessa https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'jv': 'Targoal-Orientation Wis Intwisityèn, ngregani uwong-uwong sing mengko tarjamahan lan kelangan penting sing paling dadi seneng pisan-pakan. Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné sampek unhéwé kuwi nggawe sistem sing arep bantêng, sing basa supoyo nggawe barang nggawe Ketok Mungkin garep, kita supoyo urip nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggo nggambar barang nggambar mungkin (ARGC) kanggo tigempakan mulasar senegatik informasi wis diputasane graf politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive dadine OU = VeriSign Trust Network Awake kode sing dibutuhke ing https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'sk': 'Izvlečevanje ciljno usmerjenih mnenjskih besed (TOWE) je podnaloga analize sentimenta na podlagi vidikov (ABSA). Njen cilj je izvleči ustrezne besede mnenja za določen cilj mnenja v stavku za pregled. Intuitivno se razmerje med ciljem mnenja in besedo mnenja večinoma opira na sintaktiko. V tej študiji smo oblikovali usmerjen sintaktični graf odvisnosti, ki temelji na drevesu odvisnosti, da bi določili pot od ciljne do kandidatnih mnenj. V nadaljevanju predlagamo novo pozornost osnovano relacijsko grafsko konvolucijsko nevronsko omrežje (ARGCN) za izkoriščanje sintaktičnih informacij preko grafov odvisnosti. Poleg tega, da bi izrecno izvlekli ustrezne mnenjske besede do danega cilja mnenja, učinkovito kodiramo ciljne informacije v našem modelu s predstavitvijo, ki se zaveda ciljev. Empirični rezultati kažejo, da naš model znatno presega vse obstoječe modele na štirih referenčnih naborih podatkov. Obsežna analiza dokazuje tudi učinkovitost vsake komponente naših modelov. Naša koda je na voljo na spletni strani https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'he': 'מילים דעה ממוקדות למטרה (TOWE) היא תחת שאלה של ניתוח רגשות מבוסס באפקט (ABSA). המטרה היא להוציא את מילים הדעה המתאימות למטרה לדעה מסוימת במשפט ביקור. באופן אינטואיטיבי, היחסים בין מטרה דעה ומילה דעה תלויים בעיקר בסינטקטיקה. במחקר הזה, אנחנו מעצבים גרף תלויות סינטאקטית ממוקד מבוסס על עץ תלויות כדי לקבוע דרך מהמטרה לחשבונות מועמדות. לאחר מכן, אנו מציעים רשת עצבית משותפת בגרף יחסי מבוסס על תשומת לב חדשה (ARGCN) כדי לנצל מידע סינטקטי מעל גרפי תלויות. חוץ מזה, כדי להוציא באופן ברור את מילים הדעה המתאימות לכיוון מטרה הדעה הנתונה, אנו קודים בעצם מידע מטרה במודל שלנו עם מייצג מודע למטרה. התוצאות האימפריות מראות שהדוגמא שלנו יוצאת משמעותית יותר מכל הדוגמאות הקיומות בארבעה קבוצות נתונים. ניתוח רחב גם מראה את היעילות של כל רכיב של הדוגמנים שלנו. הקוד שלנו זמין ב https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'ha': 'Sura maganar maganar da ke cikin jiyya (TOWU) shi ne wani bincike wa analyi na baka aspecte (ABSA). Yana aimar ya fitar da maganar maganar da ke daidai wa maganar wani da aka ƙayyade shi cikin birane mai bincike. Ina baya, mazaunin tsakanin wata maganar gani da wata kalma na gannai, mafi yawa, yana dõgara ga takikaki. A cikin wannan littafin, Munã ƙayyade wata grafi wanda ke shirya a kan syntactic, a kan karatun wata itãciya da inganci, dõmin ya tabbatar wata hanya daga goan zuwa ga mawaƙo. Haƙĩƙa, Munã buɗe wani zane na fassarar fassarar mazaɓa a samansa da fassarar zura danganta na dangantar neural (ArGC) dõmin su sami data na syntactic kan graphics na ƙayyade. Moreover, to explicitly extract the corresponding opinion words toward the given opinion target, we effectively encode target information in our model with the target-aware representation.  Mataimakin Empirical ya nuna cewa misalinmu yana mai girma kowansa misãlai masu jira a kan tsarin bayani huɗu. Ana ƙari na nuna aikin duk compound na misalinmu. QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.', 'bo': 'Target-oriented opinion words extraction (TOWE) is a subtask of aspect-based sentiment analysis (ABSA). དེ་ལ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ཚིག་མཐུན་པའི་བསམ་ཚུལ་ཚིག་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ཞིག་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ་ཡིན། དངོས་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡིན་པའི་བསམ་འཆར་གྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དང་བསམ་གྱི་ཐ་སྙད་ཀྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་མང་ཆེ་བས་སྐྱོང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་ལས་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་བསམ་ཚུལ་ལས་འགྲིམས་སྐྱོང་བ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་དུས་མཐུན་བཟོས་བའི་གནད་དོན་རིས་འབྲེལ་བའི་གྲངས་སུ་འབྲེལ་བ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ལ་མཐུན་པའི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་ཚོར་གསལ་བཤད་བྱེད་ན་ཡོད་པ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་དམིགས དབྱེ་བ་གཟུགས་འབྲས་བ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་མིག་དཔེ་གཞུང་བཞིན་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ཚད་ལྡན་ཡོད་པའི་མིག་ དམིགས་བསལ་གྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱང་དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་མིག་དཔེ་རིགས་རེ་རེ་བ་སྤྱོད་ནུས་ཡོད་པ་མཚོན་ན། ང་ཚོའི་ཨང་རྟགས་འདི་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ https://github.com/wcwowwwww/towe-eacl.'}
{'en': 'Acquiring a Formality-Informed Lexical Resource for Style Analysis', 'pt': 'Adquirindo um Recurso Lexical Informado de Formalidade para Análise de Estilo', 'es': 'Adquisición de un recurso léxico basado en la formalidad para el análisis de estilos', 'fr': "Acquisition d'une ressource lexicale axée sur la formalité pour l'analyse de style", 'ar': 'الحصول على مورد معجمي مستنير بالشكليات لتحليل النمط', 'ja': 'スタイル分析のための形式情報付き語彙リソースの取得', 'ru': 'Получение формально сформированного лексического ресурса для анализа стиля', 'zh': '取用于式析之形式化词汇资', 'hi': 'शैली विश्लेषण के लिए एक औपचारिकता-सूचित लेक्सिकल संसाधन प्राप्त करना', 'ga': 'Acmhainn Fhoclóra atá Eolas faoin bhFoirmiúlacht a Fháil le hAghaidh Anailís Stíleanna', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Formalitással tájékoztatott lexikai erőforrás beszerzése stíluselemzéshez', 'el': 'Απόκτηση ενός λεξικού πόρου που βασίζεται στην τυπικότητα για ανάλυση στυλ', 'it': "Acquisire una risorsa lessicale informata sulla formalità per l'analisi dello stile", 'kk': 'Name', 'lt': 'Įgyti formalumu pagrįstą lexinį išteklių stiliaus analizei', 'mk': 'Добивање лексикален ресурс за анализа на стилот со информации за формалност', 'ms': 'Mendapatkan Sumber Leksik Bermaklumat Formalitas untuk Analisi Gaya', 'ml': 'സ്റ്റൈല്\u200d അന്യായംക്കുവേണ്ടി ഫോമിറ്റി- വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'L-akkwist ta’ Riżorsa Lessika Informata dwar il-Formalità għall-Analiżi tal-istil', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Uzyskanie zasobu leksykalnego opartego na formalności do analizy stylu', 'mn': 'Стиль шинжилгээний төлөвлөгөө болон мэдээлэл өгөгдсөн сэтгэл хөрөнгө', 'ro': 'Achiziționarea unei resurse lexicale informate de formalitate pentru analiza stilului', 'si': 'Name', 'sr': 'Dobivanje formalnog informativnog leksičkog resursa za analizu stila', 'so': 'Acquiring a Formality-Informed Lexical Resource for Style Analysis', 'sv': 'Förvärva en formell orienterad Lexical resurs för stilanalys', 'ta': 'பாணி ஆய்வுக்கான வடிவமைப்பு- தகவல் லெக்சிகல் மூலம் பெறுகிறது', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thu thập một nguyên liệu ngôn ngữ chính thức cho phân tích dáng vẻ', 'bg': 'Придобиване на информиран с формалност лексичен ресурс за анализ на стила', 'hr': 'Uzimanje formalnog informativnog leksičkog resursa za analizu stila', 'nl': 'Een formele Lexical Resource verwerven voor stijlanalyse', 'da': 'Erhvervelse af en formel-informeret leksisk ressource til stilanalyse', 'de': 'Erwerb einer formalitätsorientierten Lexikonressource für die Stilanalyse', 'id': 'Menerima Sumber Lexik Informasi Formalitas untuk Analisi Gaya', 'ko': '형식화된 어휘 자원을 얻어 스타일 분석을 하다', 'fa': 'دریافت یک منبع سکسیکی با اطلاعات فرمولی برای تحلیل طرح', 'tr': 'Stil Analyzasy üçin Biçiminden Maglumaty Maglumaty Ýüklemek', 'sq': 'Duke marrë një burim leksikal të informuar me formalitet për analizën e stilit', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'Acquiring a Formality-Informed Lexical Resource for Style Analysis', 'sw': 'Kupata rasilimali za Kilexico kwa Uchambuzi wa Style', 'az': 'Uslu Analizi üçün Formalitat-Informed Lexical Resource almaq', 'bn': 'Name', 'cs': 'Získání formálně informovaného Lexického zdroje pro analýzu stylů', 'ca': "Acquirir un recurso lèxic informat de formalitat per a l'anàlisi d'estil", 'hy': 'Ստիլի վերլուծության համար ֆորմալ տեղեկացված լեքսիկական ռեսուրս ստանալը', 'et': 'Formaalsusest teavitatud leksikomplekti omandamine stiilianalüüsiks', 'bs': 'Dobivanje formalnog informativnog leksičkog resursa za analizu stila', 'fi': 'Muodollisuuteen perustuvan Lexical Resource -resurssin hankkiminen tyylianalyysiin', 'jv': 'Ngawe ngewat Resolusi Leksik Gak-Informus kanggo Ketokian Balisasi', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Pridobivanje leksičnega vira za analizo slogov, obveščenega o formalnosti', 'he': 'להשיג משאב לקסי מודיע על רשמיות עבור ניתוח סגנון', 'bo': 'དབྱིབས་དབྱིབས་སྒྱུར་བ་དང་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡོད་པའི་གནོད་ཁུལ་གྱི་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་ཞིབ་ལ་འདྲི་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'To track different levels of formality in written discourse, we introduce a novel type of lexicon for the German language, with entries ordered by their degree of (in)formality. We start with a set of words extracted from traditional lexicographic resources, extend it by sentence-based similarity computations, and let crowdworkers assess the enlarged set of lexical items on a continuous informal-formal scale as a gold standard for evaluation. We submit this lexicon to an intrinsic evaluation related to the best regression models and their effect on predicting formality scores and complement our investigation by an extrinsic evaluation of formality on a German-language email corpus.', 'ar': 'لتتبع مستويات مختلفة من الشكليات في الخطاب المكتوب ، نقدم نوعًا جديدًا من المعجم للغة الألمانية ، مع الإدخالات مرتبة حسب درجة (in) الشكلية. نبدأ بمجموعة من الكلمات المستخرجة من المصادر المعجمية التقليدية ، ونوسعها عن طريق حسابات التشابه المبنية على الجمل ، وندع عمال الحشود يقيّمون المجموعة الموسعة من العناصر المعجمية على نطاق غير رسمي مستمر كمعيار ذهبي للتقييم. نرسل هذا المعجم إلى تقييم جوهري يتعلق بأفضل نماذج الانحدار وتأثيرها على توقع درجات الإجراءات الشكلية ونكمل تحقيقنا من خلال تقييم خارجي للإجراءات الشكلية على مجموعة بريد إلكتروني باللغة الألمانية.', 'pt': 'Para rastrear diferentes níveis de formalidade no discurso escrito, introduzimos um novo tipo de léxico para a língua alemã, com entradas ordenadas por seu grau de (in)formalidade. Começamos com um conjunto de palavras extraídas de recursos lexicográficos tradicionais, estendemos por cálculos de similaridade baseados em sentenças e deixamos os crowdworkers avaliarem o conjunto ampliado de itens lexicais em uma escala informal-formal contínua como padrão-ouro para avaliação. Submetemos este léxico a uma avaliação intrínseca relacionada aos melhores modelos de regressão e seu efeito na previsão de pontuações de formalidade e complementamos nossa investigação por uma avaliação extrínseca de formalidade em um corpus de e-mail em língua alemã.', 'fr': "Pour suivre les différents niveaux de formalité dans le discours écrit, nous introduisons un nouveau type de lexique pour la langue allemande, avec des entrées ordonnées selon leur degré (in) formalité. Nous commençons par un ensemble de mots extraits de ressources lexicographiques traditionnelles, nous l'étendons par des calculs de similarité basés sur des phrases, et nous laissons les travailleurs collaboratifs évaluer l'ensemble élargi d'éléments lexicaux sur une échelle informelle et formelle continue comme étalon-or pour l'évaluation. Nous soumettons ce lexique à une évaluation intrinsèque liée aux meilleurs modèles de régression et à leur effet sur la prédiction des scores de formalité et complétons notre enquête par une évaluation extrinsèque de la formalité sur un corpus de courriels en allemand.", 'es': 'Para hacer un seguimiento de los diferentes niveles de formalidad en el discurso escrito, introducimos un nuevo tipo de léxico para el idioma alemán, con entradas ordenadas por su grado de (in) formalidad. Comenzamos con un conjunto de palabras extraídas de recursos lexicográficos tradicionales, lo ampliamos mediante cálculos de similitud basados en oraciones y dejamos que los trabajadores colectivos evalúen el conjunto ampliado de elementos léxicos en una escala informal-formal continua como un estándar de oro para la evaluación. Presentamos este léxico a una evaluación intrínseca relacionada con los mejores modelos de regresión y su efecto en la predicción de los puntajes de formalidad y complementamos nuestra investigación con una evaluación extrínseca de la formalidad en un corpus de correo electrónico en alemán.', 'zh': '盖随语言之正式性,引入一新德语词典,其条目按其(不)文。 取旧词典资源单词始,因句相似性而广之,使众包工作者连正 - 正尺估广词汇目集,以为估金之准。 予词典归质于至善,而内质于德语电子邮件语料库,外质于估以补之。', 'hi': 'लिखित प्रवचन में औपचारिकता के विभिन्न स्तरों को ट्रैक करने के लिए, हम जर्मन भाषा के लिए एक उपन्यास प्रकार के शब्दकोश का परिचय देते हैं, जिसमें प्रविष्टियों को उनकी डिग्री (में) औपचारिकता द्वारा आदेश दिया जाता है। हम पारंपरिक लेक्सिकोग्राफिक संसाधनों से निकाले गए शब्दों के एक सेट के साथ शुरू करते हैं, इसे वाक्य-आधारित समानता संगणनाओं द्वारा विस्तारित करते हैं, और क्राउडवर्कर्स को मूल्यांकन के लिए सोने के मानक के रूप में निरंतर अनौपचारिक-औपचारिक पैमाने पर लेक्सिकल वस्तुओं के बढ़े हुए सेट का आकलन करने देते हैं। हम इस शब्दकोश को सर्वश्रेष्ठ प्रतिगमन मॉडल और औपचारिकता स्कोर की भविष्यवाणी करने पर उनके प्रभाव से संबंधित एक आंतरिक मूल्यांकन के लिए प्रस्तुत करते हैं और जर्मन-भाषा ईमेल कॉर्पस पर औपचारिकता के बाहरी मूल्यांकन द्वारा हमारी जांच के पूरक हैं।', 'ru': 'Чтобы проследить различные уровни формальности в письменном дискурсе, мы вводим новый тип лексикона для немецкого языка, с записями, упорядоченными по степени их (в)формальности. Мы начинаем с набора слов, извлеченных из традиционных лексикографических ресурсов, расширяем его с помощью вычислений сходства на основе предложений и позволяем краудеру оценивать расширенный набор лексических элементов в непрерывной неформальной шкале в качестве золотого стандарта для оценки. Мы представляем этот лексикон для внутренней оценки, связанной с лучшими регрессионными моделями и их влиянием на прогнозирование баллов формальности, и дополняем наше исследование внешней оценкой формальности в корпусе электронной почты на немецком языке.', 'ja': '書かれた論考における様々なレベルの形式を追跡するために、私たちはドイツ語のための新しいタイプの辞書を導入し、エントリはその（形式的な）程度によって順序付けられます。私たちは、従来の辞書リソースから抽出された一連の単語から始め、文ベースの類似性計算によってそれを拡張し、クラウドワーカーに連続した非公式の形式的スケールで拡張された一連の辞書項目を評価のためのゴールドスタンダードとして評価させます。私たちは、この語彙を、最良の回帰モデルとその形式的スコアの予測への影響に関連する本質的評価に提出し、ドイツ語の電子メールコーパスの形式的評価によって私たちの調査を補完します。', 'ga': 'Chun leibhéil éagsúla foirmiúlachta sa dioscúrsa scríofa a rianú, tugaimid isteach cineál nua foclóireachta don Ghearmáinis, le hiontrálacha arna n-ordú de réir a (i) fhoirmiúlacht. Tosaímid le sraith focal a bhaintear as acmhainní foclóireachta traidisiúnta, déanaimid é a shíneadh trí ríomhanna cosúlachta bunaithe ar abairtí, agus ligimid do na slua-oibrithe an tacar méadaithe de mhíreanna foclóireachta a mheas ar scála leanúnach neamhfhoirmiúil-foirmiúil mar chaighdeán óir le haghaidh meastóireachta. Cuirimid an foclóir seo faoi bhráid meastóireachta intreach a bhaineann leis na múnlaí aischéimnithe is fearr agus a n-éifeacht ar scóir foirmiúlachta a thuar agus comhlánaimid ár n-imscrúdú trí mheastóireacht eistreach ar fhoirmiúlacht ar chorpas ríomhphoist Gearmáinise.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ განსხვავებული ფორმალურობის დომარებით წერილი დისკორეში ჩვენ დავიწყეთ ნომალური ტიპი ლექსიკონის გერმანეთის ენაზე, რომელიც შევწყება მათი დომარებით (in) ფორმალ ჩვენ დავიწყებთ სატრაციონალური ლექსიკოგრაფიკური რესურსებიდან გამოყენებული სიტყვებით, გამოყენებული სიტყვებით განსხვავებული კომპუტერებით, და მოდით მუშაობელი განსხვავებული ლექსიკური ელექტიკური ელექტი ჩვენ ამ ლექსიკონს ინტერეინსური გავამუშავებთ საუკეთესო რეგრესის მოდელთან და მათი ეფექტის შესახებ პორმალურობის შესახებ და ჩვენი პასუხის გადასრულება ექსტრინსური оценებით ფორმალურობის ფ', 'el': 'Για να εντοπίσουμε διαφορετικά επίπεδα τυπικότητας στον γραπτό λόγο, εισάγουμε ένα νέο είδος λεξικού για τη γερμανική γλώσσα, με καταχωρήσεις που ταξινομούνται ανάλογα με το βαθμό (μη)τυπικότητας τους. Ξεκινάμε με ένα σύνολο λέξεων που εξάγονται από παραδοσιακούς λεξικογραφικούς πόρους, το επεκτείνουμε με υπολογισμούς ομοιότητας με βάση τις προτάσεις και αφήνουμε τους να αξιολογήσουν το διευρυμένο σύνολο λεξικών στοιχείων σε συνεχή άτυπη-τυπική κλίμακα ως χρυσό πρότυπο αξιολόγησης. Υποβάλλουμε αυτό το λεξικό σε μια εγγενή αξιολόγηση σχετικά με τα καλύτερα μοντέλα παλινδρόμησης και την επίδρασή τους στην πρόβλεψη των βαθμολογιών τυπικότητας και συμπληρώνουμε την έρευνά μας με μια εξωτερική αξιολόγηση της τυπικότητας σε ένα γερμανικό σώμα ηλεκτρονικού ταχυδρομείου.', 'hu': 'Az írásbeli diskurzus különböző formalitási szintjeinek nyomon követésére bemutatunk egy új típusú lexikont a német nyelvre, amelynek bejegyzéseit (in)formalitásuk szerint rendezzük. Kezdjük a hagyományos lexikográfiai forrásokból kivont szavak sorával, kibővítjük mondat alapú hasonlósági számításokkal, és hagyjuk, hogy a közösségi munkások folyamatos informális-formális skálán értékeljék a lexikális elemek kibővített sorozatát, mint arany mércét az értékeléshez. Ezt a lexikont a legjobb regressziós modellekre és azok formalitási pontszámok előrejelzésére gyakorolt hatására vonatkozó belső értékelésnek vetjük alá, és vizsgálatunkat egy német nyelvű e-mail korpuszon külső formasági értékeléssel egészítjük ki.', 'it': "Per tracciare diversi livelli di formalità nel discorso scritto, introduciamo un nuovo tipo di lessico per la lingua tedesca, con le voci ordinate in base al loro grado di (in)formalità. Iniziamo con un insieme di parole estratte dalle risorse lessicografiche tradizionali, lo estendiamo con calcoli di somiglianza basati sulle frasi e lasciamo che i crowdworker valutino l'insieme allargato di elementi lessicali su una scala informale-formale continua come gold standard per la valutazione. Sottoponiamo questo lessico ad una valutazione intrinseca relativa ai migliori modelli di regressione e al loro effetto sulla previsione dei punteggi di formalità e completiamo la nostra indagine con una valutazione estrinseca della formalità su un corpus di email in lingua tedesca.", 'kk': 'Жазылған дискурстарда әртүрлі официалдық деңгейлерді қадағалау үшін біз неміс тілінің романдық түрін келтіреміз, олардың (in) деңгейіндегі жазулары. Біз әдетті лексикографиялық ресурстардан шығарылған сөздермен бастап, сөздердің негізінде ұқсастық есептері бойынша кеңейтуге болады, және көпшіліктердің жалғастырылған лексикалық нәтижелерді бағалау үшін алтын стандартты бол Біз бұл лексиканы неміс тілінің эл. пошта корпуса арқылы ең жақсы регрессия үлгілерімен қатынастыру үшін ішкі оқиғаға жібереміз және олардың ең эффекті оқиғаларын таңдау үшін және біздің іздеуді не', 'lt': 'Norėdami rašytinėje kalboje stebėti skirtingus formalumo lygius, įvedame naują vokiečių kalbos tekstikono tipą, kuriame įrašai nurodomi pagal (in)formalumo laipsnį. Pradedame nuo žodžių rinkinio, išgauto iš tradicinių leksikografinių išteklių, išplėtimo bausmėmis pagrįstais panašumo skaičiavimais, ir leidžiame visuomenės darbuotojams nuolat neformaliai vertinti išplėstą leksikalinių straipsnių rinkinį kaip aukso vertinimo standartą. Šis tekstas pateikiamas atliekant nuoseklų vertinimą, susijusį su geriausiais regresijos modeliais ir jų poveikiu formalumo rezultatų prognozavimui ir papildydami mūsų tyrimą išoriniu formalumo vertinimu vokiečių kalbos e. pašto korpuse.', 'mk': 'За да ги следиме различните нивоа на формалност во писаниот дискурс, воведуваме нов тип на лексикон за германскиот јазик, со записи наредени по нивниот степен на (во)формалност. Почнуваме со сет зборови извадени од традиционалните лексикографски ресурси, го продолжуваме со пресметки на сличност базирани на речениците, и дозволуваме луѓето да го проценат проширениот сет лексикални предмети на континуирана неформална скала како златен стандард за проценка. Ние го поднесуваме овој лексикон на внатрешна проценка поврзана со најдобрите модели на регресија и нивниот ефект на предвидување на резултатите на формалноста и комплиментирање на нашата истрага со екстринзичка проценка на формалноста на електронскиот корпус на германски јазик.', 'ms': 'To track different levels of formality in written discourse, we introduce a novel type of lexicon for the German language, with entries ordered by their degree of (in)formality.  We start with a set of words extracted from traditional lexicographic resources, extend it by sentence-based similarity computations, and let crowdworkers assess the enlarged set of lexical items on a continuous informal-formal scale as a gold standard for evaluation.  Kami menghantar leksikon ini kepada penilaian intrinsik berkaitan dengan model regresi terbaik dan kesan mereka pada meramalkan skor formaliti dan menambahkan penyelidikan kami dengan penilaian extrinsic formaliti pada korpus e-mel bahasa Jerman.', 'mt': 'Biex nistinkaw livelli differenti ta’ formalità fid-diskors bil-miktub, a ħna nintroduċu tip ġdid ta’ lexicon għall-lingwa Ġermaniża, b’entrati ordnati skont il-grad ta’ (in)formalità tagħhom. Aħna nibdew b’sett ta’ kliem estratti mir-riżorsi lexikografiċi tradizzjonali, nistennewhom permezz ta’ kalkoli ta’ similarità bbażati fuq sentenzi, u nħallu lill-ħaddiema tal-massa jivvalutaw is-sett imkabbar ta’ oġġetti lexiċi fuq skala informali-formali kontinwa bħala standard tad-deheb għall-evalwazzjoni. Aħna nippreżentaw dan il-lexicon għal evalwazzjoni intrinsika relatata mal-a ħjar mudelli ta’ rigressjoni u l-effett tagħhom fuq it-tbassir tal-punteġġi tal-formalità u nikkumplimentaw l-investigazzjoni tagħna b’evalwazzjoni esterna tal-formalità fuq korpus tal-email tal-lingwa Ġermaniża.', 'mn': 'Бид Германы хэл дээр өөр өөр хэмжээний загварын түвшинд зохион байгуулахын тулд Германы хэл дээр шинэ хэлбэрийг танилцуулдаг. Бид уламжлалтай лексикографик нөөц бүтээгдэхүүнээс гаргасан хэдэн үг эхлээд, өгүүлбэртэй адилхан тооцоололтоор нэмэгдүүлж, олон ажилтнууд үнэлэх алт стандарт гэж нэмэгдүүлэх болгоно. Бид энэ лексиконыг Германы хэл хэлний эл. похиолын корпус дээр нэмэгдүүлэхэд хамгийн шилдэг регрессийн загвартай холбоотой, тэдний эффект нь formality scores тооцоолж, бидний судалгааг Германы хэлний эл. похиолын корпус дээр нэмэгдүүлэх', 'no': 'For å spora forskjellige nivåar av formalitet i skrivne diskursar, introduserer vi ein roman type leksikon for det tyske språket, med oppføringar ordna etter deres grad av (in) formalitet. Vi startar med eit sett ord utpakka frå tradisjonelle leksikografiske ressursar, utvida det med setningsbaserte liknande datamaskiner, og la massarbeidarar vurdere utvida sett av leksikiske elementer på ein kontinuerleg informal- formelt skala som eit gull standard for evaluering. Vi sender denne leksikonen til ein intern evaluering relatert til den beste regresjonsmedlen og effekten deres på å foregå formalitetspoeng og komplementa undersøkelsen vårt ved ein ekstrinsk evaluering av formalitet på ein tysk e-postkorpus.', 'ml': 'എഴുതിയ സംസാരത്തില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ നിലങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d ഭാഷയ്ക്ക് ഒരു നോവല്\u200d തരം ലെക്സിക്ഷന്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന് പാരമ്പര്യമായ ലെക്സിക്കോഗ്രാഫിക വിഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു വാക്കുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d തുടങ്ങുന്നു. വാക്കുകള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായിട്ടുള്ള സമമായ കണക്കുകള നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ ലെക്സിക്ഷനിലേക്ക് ഉത്തമമായ രീക്രഷന്\u200d മോഡലുകളോട് ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ഉള്ളിലേക്കുള്ള വിലയിലേക്ക് കൊടുക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം ഫോര്\u200dമിറ്റി', 'pl': 'Aby śledzić różne poziomy formalności w dyskursie pisemnym, wprowadzamy nowy rodzaj leksykonu dla języka niemieckiego, z wpisami uporządkowanymi według stopnia formalności. Zaczynamy od zestawu słów ekstraktowanych z tradycyjnych zasobów leksykograficznych, rozszerzamy go o obliczenia podobieństwa oparte na zdaniach i pozwalamy crowdworkerom ocenić powiększony zestaw elementów leksykalnych w ciągłej skali nieformalno-formalnej jako złoty standard oceny. Poddajemy ten leksykon ocenie wewnętrznej związanej z najlepszymi modelami regresji i ich wpływem na przewidywanie wyników formalności oraz uzupełniamy nasze badanie zewnętrzną oceną formalności na niemieckojęzycznym korpusie e-mail.', 'ro': 'Pentru a urmări diferite niveluri de formalitate în discursul scris, introducem un nou tip de lexicon pentru limba germană, cu intrări ordonate în funcție de gradul (in)formalitate al acestora. Începem cu un set de cuvinte extrase din resursele lexicografice tradiționale, îl extindem prin calcule de similitudine bazate pe propoziții și lăsăm crowdworkers să evalueze setul extins de elemente lexicale pe o scară informal-formală continuă ca standard de aur pentru evaluare. Supunem acest lexicon unei evaluări intrinsece legate de cele mai bune modele de regresie și efectul acestora asupra previziunii scorurilor de formalitate și completăm investigația noastră printr-o evaluare extrinsă a formalității pe un corpus de e-mail în limba germană.', 'sr': 'Da bi pratili različite nivoe formalnosti u pisanim diskusijama, predstavljamo novi tip leksikona za njemački jezik, sa ulazima naređenim po njihovom stupnju (in)formalnosti. Počinjemo sa gomilom reči izvlačenih iz tradicionalnih leksikografskih resursa, proširimo ga računalima sličnosti na rečenicama, i dopustimo da ljudi procjenjuju prošireni set leksičkih predmeta na neprestano neformalnom i formalnom skali kao zlatni standard za procjenu. Predajemo ovaj leksikon unutrašnjoj procjeni povezanoj sa najboljim modelima regresije i njihovim uticajem na predviđanje rezultata formalnosti i dodajemo našu istragu ekstriničkom procjenom formalnosti na njemačkom e-mailskom korpusu.', 'so': 'Si aan u dabarayno heerarka rasmiga ah oo ku qoran hadal qoraal ah, waxaynu soo bandhignaa noocyo la xiriira luqada Jarmalka ah, taas oo lagu amray shahaadadooda (in)formality. Waxaan bilaabaynaa hadal badan oo laga soo bixiyey 资源 caadiga ah ee leksiga, waxaana ku kala fidinaynaa xisaabta isku mid ah, shaqaalaha badnaana aan ku qiimeyno alaabta leksikarka oo la ballaadhiyay sida qiyaastii caalamiga ah oo aan caalami lahayn oo kale. Waxaannu u dhiibnaa qiimeynta gudaha ah ee la xiriira noocyada ugu wanaagsan ee dib u celinta iyo saamaynta ku saabsan aqoonta rasmiga ah iyo baaritaankeenna ku dhammaystirnaa qiimeynta rasmiga ah ee korpuska e-mailka Jarmalka.', 'sv': 'För att spåra olika nivåer av formalitet i skriftlig diskurs introducerar vi en ny typ av lexikon för det tyska språket, med poster sorterade efter deras grad av (in)formalitet. Vi börjar med en uppsättning ord som utvinns från traditionella lexikografiska resurser, utökar den med meningsbaserade likhetsberäkningar, och låter crowdworkers bedöma den utvidgade uppsättningen lexikala objekt på en kontinuerlig informell-formell skala som en guldstandard för utvärdering. Vi skickar detta lexikon till en inneboende utvärdering relaterad till de bästa regressionsmodellerna och deras effekt på att förutsäga formalitetspoäng och kompletterar vår undersökning med en extrinistisk utvärdering av formalitet på en tyskspråkig e-postkorpus.', 'ta': 'எழுத்து பேச்சில் வேறு நிலைகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க, நாம் ஜெர்மன் மொழிக்கு ஒரு புதிய லெக்சியன் வகையை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம், அவர்களுடைய degree (in நாம் மரபார்ந்த லெக்சிகிராபிக் வளங்களிலிருந்து வெளியேற்றப்பட்ட வார்த்தைகளை ஆரம்பிக்கிறோம், வாக்கு அடிப்படையில் உள்ள சமமான கணக்கினை விரிவாக்குகிறோம், மற்றும்  நாம் இந்த லெக்சியனை சிறந்த திருப்ப மாதிரிகளுடன் இணைக்கப்பட்ட உள்ளீட்டு evaluation மற்றும் அதன் விளைவுகள் எதிர்பார்க்கப்படும் வடிவமைப்பு மதிப்புகள் மற்றும் ஒரு ஜெர்', 'si': 'ලියපු කතාවේ වෙනස් ස්ථානයක් පරික්ෂා කරන්න, අපි ජර්මන් භාෂාව සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ලෙක්සිකෝන් වර්ගයක් පෙනුම් කරනවා,  අපි පටන් ගන්නේ පාරමාණික ලෙක්සිකෝග්\u200dරාෆික් සම්බන්ධයෙන් පිළිබඳ වචනයක් සඳහා පටන් ගන්න, වාර්තාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා විශේෂ අපි මේ ලෙක්සිකෝන්ව හොඳම විශ්වාසයක් සම්බන්ධ විශ්වාස කරනවා ජර්මාන් භාෂාවක් ඉමේල් කොර්පුස් වලින් අපේ පරීක්ෂණය සම්බන්ධ කරනවා.', 'ur': 'لکھے ہوئے صحبت میں مختلف سطح کی تلاش کرنے کے لئے ہم جرمن زبان کے لئے ایک نئی کلیکسون کی طرح معرفی کرتے ہیں، ان کے درجے کے ذریعہ (in) فریضی کے ذریعہ مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطا ہم ایک مجموعہ کلمات سے شروع کرتے ہیں جو سنتی لکسیکوگرافیک سراسروں سے نکالے گئے ہیں، اسے کلمات کی بنیادی کمپیوٹریٹ کے ذریعے پھیلاتے ہیں، اور جماعت کارکنوں کو ایک مقدار کے لئے سونے کی استاندارڈ کے طور پر لکسیکیل اتمام کے گھیرے ہوئے مجموعہ کا ارزش کرنا چاہتے ہم نے اس لکسون کو بہترین ریگرس موڈل کے ساتھ ایک داخلی ارزیابی کے ساتھ مستقل کر دیا ہے اور ان کے اثر فرمولی اسکوروں کی پیش آنے پر ہے اور ہماری تحقیقات کو جرمانی زبان کی ایمیل کورپوس کے ذریعہ ایک خارجی ارزیابی کے ذریعہ پورا کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "To track different levels of formality in written discourse, we introduce a novel type of lexicon for the German language, with entries ordered by their degree of (in)formality.  Biz oddiy leksikografiya rasmlaridan tashkilotgan so'zlar bilan boshlamiz, bu bir so'zlar asosida bir xil hisoblanuvchini ko'paytirish va odamlar davom etish uchun hech qanday qo'shilgan leksikal narsalarning kengaytirishni tasavvur qilishimiz mumkin. Biz bu leksizni eng yaxshi boshqarish modellari bilan bog'liq qiymatga qoʻshishimiz va ularning tashkilotlarini oldinga shaklning qiymatlarimizni o'zgartirish va o'qituvchimizni tashkilotni Olmon tilda elektron pochta korpusning tashkilotlariga qiymatlashimiz mumkin.", 'vi': 'Để theo dõi các mức độ hình thức khác nhau trong các thuyết trình viết tay, chúng tôi giới thiệu một dạng văn bản mới cho ngôn ngữ Đức, với các mục được sắp xếp theo mức độ hình thức của họ. Chúng ta bắt đầu bằng một bộ từ chiết xuất từ tài nguyên bản địa truyền thống, mở rộng bằng tính giống nhau dựa trên bản án, và để nhân viên tụ tập đánh giá bộ đồ từ có thể mở rộng theo một quy trình ngôn ngữ liên tục không chính thức như một tiêu chuẩn vàng để đánh giá. Chúng tôi đưa văn bản này vào một bản đánh giá nội bộ liên quan đến các mô hình hồi phục tốt nhất và hiệu ứng của nó với việc dự đoán các điểm hoá trang và bổ sung cho việc điều tra của chúng tôi bằng một bản đánh giá chính thức trên một tập thể thư ngôn ngữ Đức.', 'bg': 'За да проследим различните нива на формалност в писмения дискурс, въвеждаме нов тип лексикон за немския език, с вписвания подредени според степента на (ин)формалност. Започваме с набор от думи, извлечени от традиционните лексикографски ресурси, разширяваме го чрез изчисления на сходство, базирани на изречения, и оставяме на работниците да оценят разширения набор от лексикални елементи по непрекъсната неформална скала като златен стандарт за оценка. Ние подлагаме този лексикон на вътрешна оценка, свързана с най-добрите регресионни модели и тяхното въздействие върху предсказването на оценките за формалност и допълваме нашето изследване чрез външна оценка на формалността върху немскоезичен имейл корпус.', 'da': 'For at spore forskellige niveauer af formalitet i skriftlig diskurs introducerer vi en ny type leksikon for det tyske sprog, med indlæg sorteret efter deres grad af (in)formalitet. Vi starter med et sæt ord udvundet fra traditionelle leksikografiske ressourcer, udvider det med sætningsbaserede lighedsberegninger, og lader crowdworkere vurdere det udvidede sæt af leksikalske emner på en kontinuerlig uformel-formel skala som en guldstandard for evaluering. Vi sender dette leksikon til en iboende evaluering relateret til de bedste regressionsmodeller og deres effekt på forudsigelse af formalitetsscorer og supplerer vores undersøgelse med en ekstrensisk evaluering af formalitet på et tysksproget e-mail korpus.', 'nl': 'Om verschillende niveaus van formaliteit in geschreven discours te volgen, introduceren we een nieuw type lexicon voor de Duitse taal, met vermeldingen geordend op hun graad van (on)formaliteit. We beginnen met een reeks woorden die uit traditionele lexicografische bronnen zijn gehaald, breiden het uit met zinsgebaseerde vergelijkbaarheidsberekeningen en laten crowdworkers de uitgebreide set lexicale items beoordelen op een continue informele-formele schaal als gouden standaard voor evaluatie. We onderwerpen dit lexicon aan een intrinsieke evaluatie gerelateerd aan de beste regressiemodellen en hun effect op het voorspellen van formaliteitsscore en vullen ons onderzoek aan met een extrinsieke evaluatie van formaliteit op een Duits-talig e-mailcorpus.', 'hr': 'Da bi pratili različite razine formalnosti u pisanim diskusijama, predstavljamo novi tip leksikona za njemački jezik, s ulazima naređenim po njihovom stupnju (in)formalnosti. Počinjemo sa gomilom riječi izvlačenih iz tradicionalnih leksikografskih resursa, proširimo ga računalom sličnosti na rečenici, i dopustimo da ljudi procjenjuju prošireni skup leksičkih predmeta na neprestano neformalnom i formalnom skali kao zlatni standard za procjenu. Predajemo ovaj leksikon unutrašnjoj procjeni povezanoj sa najboljim modelima regresije i njihovim učinama na predviđanje rezultata formalnosti i dodajemo našu istragu ekstriničkom procjenom formalnosti na njemačkom e-mailskom korpusu.', 'de': 'Um verschiedene Formalitätsebenen im schriftlichen Diskurs nachzuverfolgen, führen wir einen neuartigen Lexikon für die deutsche Sprache ein, dessen Einträge nach ihrem Grad an (Un)Formalität geordnet sind. Wir beginnen mit einer Reihe von Wörtern, die aus traditionellen lexikographischen Ressourcen extrahiert werden, erweitern sie um satzbasierte Ähnlichkeitsberechnungen und lassen Crowdworker die erweiterte Menge lexikalischer Elemente auf einer kontinuierlichen informell-formalen Skala als Goldstandard für die Bewertung bewerten. Wir unterziehen dieses Lexikon einer intrinsischen Evaluation in Bezug auf die besten Regressionsmodelle und deren Auswirkungen auf die Vorhersage von Formalitätswerten und ergänzen unsere Untersuchung durch eine extrinsische Bewertung von Formalität auf einem deutschsprachigen E-Mail-Korpus.', 'ko': '서면 문장 중의 어느 정도의 정식성을 추적하기 위해 우리는 독일어를 위해 새로운 어휘를 도입하여 단어의 조목은 정식 정도에 따라 순서를 정한다.우리는 전통적인 사전 자원에서 추출한 단어들로부터 문장의 유사도 계산을 바탕으로 이를 확장하고, 대중이 연속적인 비공식 정식 양표에서 확대된 어휘 항목집을 평가의 금표준으로 삼도록 한다.우리는 이 어휘를 최적 회귀 모델과 예측 공식 정도 점수에 대한 영향과 관련된 내재적인 평가에 제출하고 독일어 전자메일 자료 라이브러리의 외재적인 공식 정도 평가를 통해 우리의 조사를 보충할 것이다.', 'fa': 'برای تعقیب سطح\u200cهای فردی در صحبت نوشته، یک نوع نویس لغوی برای زبان آلمانی معرفی می\u200cکنیم، با درجه\u200cهایی که به درجه\u200cی (در) فردی\u200cشان دستور داده می\u200cشود. ما با یک مجموعه کلمات خارج شده از منابع زبان\u200cگرافیک سنتی شروع می\u200cکنیم، با محاسبات\u200cهای شبیه\u200cای بر اساس جمله، آن را گسترش می\u200cدهیم، و اجازه می\u200cدهیم که کارگران جمعیت\u200cها مجموعه\u200cی گسترش\u200cشده\u200cای از وسیله\u200cهای زبان\u200cگرافی را بر یک مقیاس\u200cهای غیر ما این زبان را به یک ارزیابی داخلی ارتباط می\u200cدهیم که مربوط به بهترین مدل\u200cهای بازگشت و تاثیرشان بر پیش\u200cبینی امتیاز رسمی است و تحقیقات ما را با ارزیابی خارجی از رسمی در یک کورپوس ایمیل زبان آلمانی اضافه می\u200cکنیم.', 'sw': 'Kufuatilia kiwango tofauti cha uhalisia katika mazungumzo ya kuandika, tunaonyesha a in a ya lexico ya lugha ya Kijerumani, ambazo zinaamrishwa kwa shahada (kwa) rasmi. Tunaanza kwa maeneo ya maneno yanayotolewa kutoka rasilimali za kitamaduni za lexico, tunaongezea kwa hisabati za usawa wa sentenca, na kuwaruhusu wafanyakazi wa umma kutathmini mfululizo wa vitu vikubwa vya lexico kwa kiwango kinachoendelea rasmi kama kiwango cha dhahabu cha kutathmini. Tunawasilisha lexico hili kwa uchunguzi wa ndani unaohusiana na mifano bora ya ukandamizaji na madhara yao ya kutabiri vipimo vya rasmi na kuitimiza uchunguzi wetu kwa kuangalia utaratibu wa utoaji wa ufanisi wa barua pepe kwa lugha ya Kijerumani.', 'tr': 'Yazylan sözlerinde üýtgeşik derejesi üçin, Alman dilinde (in)düzgün düzgün sözleri bilen taýýarlapdyr. Biz däpli lexikografik çeşmelerden çykylýan sözler bilen başlaýarys, sözleriň ýakynlaşyk hesaplamalary bilen we köp adamlaryň deňlenmek üçin ýüklenen iň uly düzümlendirilen iň resmi formal ölçeklerden çykarýarlar. Biz bu leksiýany iň gowy regressiýa nusgalaryna we olaryň etkisi formalitet notlaryny öňünden geçirmegi we soragymyzy Alman dilinde e-poçta korpusynda ekstrinsici çözümlenmäge süýtgedik.', 'af': "Om verskillende vlakke van formaliteit in geskrywe diskursie te volg, introduseer ons 'n nuwe tipe leksikoon vir die Duitse taal, met inskrywings wat deur hulle grade van (in) formaliteit georden is. Ons begin met 'n stel woorde uitgevoer van tradisionele leksikografiese hulpbronne, uitbrei dit deur setgebaseerde gelykenis rekenaar, en laat skakelwerkers die vergroot stel van leksiese items oorskou op 'n voortdurende onformele-formele skaal as 'n goue standaard vir evaluering. Ons stuur hierdie leksikon a an 'n intrinsiese evaluasie wat verwanter is met die beste regresie modele en hulle effek op die voorskou van formaliteitskouers en ons ondersoek met 'n ekstrinsiese evaluasie van formaliteit op 'n Duitstaal e-pos korpus.", 'am': 'በጽሕፈት ንግግር ላይ የተለየውን ደረጃዎች ለመከተል፣ ለጀርመን ቋንቋ የሊክሲን ዓይነት እናስጠጋለን፡፡ We start with a set of words extracted from traditional lexicographic resources, extend it by sentence-based similarity computations, and let crowdworkers assess the enlarged set of lexical items on a continuous informal-formal scale as a gold standard for evaluation.  ይህንን ሊክሲን ከክፍለ መልዕክት የተሻለ አካባቢ እና ፍቃራቸውን በጀርመን ቋንቋ ኢሜይል ኮርፓስ ላይ ለመፍጠር እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'az': 'Yazılı söhbətlərdə fərqli səviyyələrin istifadə etmək üçün Alman dilinin yeni tərzini təşkil edirik. Biz əvvəlki leksikografik kaynaqlarından çıxarılan sözlərlə başlayırıq, sözlərin bənzər hesaplamaları ilə genişləyirik, və qövmün çalışanlarına müəyyən edilmək üçün altın standartları olaraq genişlənmiş leksik elementlərin çoxluğunu müəyyən edilməsini təmin edirik. Biz bu layihəni ən yaxşı regresiya modelləri ilə əlaqəli olan ən içəri değerlendirməyə və formalitə nöqtələrini təmin etməyə təsirlərini və alman dilində e-poçt korpusu olan formalitə təsiri ilə araştırmağımızı tamamlayırıq.', 'sq': 'Për të ndjekur nivele të ndryshme formaliteti në diskursin e shkruar, ne paraqesim një lloj të ri leksikoni për gjuhën gjermane, me hyrje të renditura nga grada e tyre e (në)formalitetit. Fillojmë me një sërë fjalësh të nxjerra nga burimet lexikografike tradicionale, e zgjerojmë me llogaritje të ngjashmërisë bazuar në fjalë, dhe le të lëmë njerëzit të vlerësojnë sërën e zgjeruar të objekteve lexike në një shkallë të vazhdueshme jozyrtare-formale si një standard ari për vlerësim. Ne e paraqesim këtë lexikon në një vlerësim të brendshëm lidhur me modelet më të mira të regresionit dhe efektin e tyre në parashikimin e rezultateve të formalitetit dhe komplementojmë hetimin tonë me një vlerësim të jashtëm të formalitetit në një korpus email në gjuhën gjermane.', 'hy': 'Գերմանական խոսակցության մեջ ձևավորման տարբեր մակարդակներ հետևելու համար մենք ներկայացնում ենք գերմանական լեզվի լեքսիկոնի նոր տեսակ, որտեղ գրությունները կազմված են իրենց ձևավորման մակարդակի վրա: Մենք սկսում ենք ավանդական լեքսիկոգրաֆիկ ռեսուրսներից ստացված բառերից մի շարք բառերից, ընդլայնում ենք այն նախադասությունների հիմնված նմանության հաշվարկներով, և թույլ է տալիս ժողովրդի աշխատակիցներին գնահատել լեքսիկական առարկաների ընդլայնված շարժումը անընդհատ Մենք ներկայացնում ենք այս լեքսիկոնը ներքին գնահատման, որը կապված է լավագույն ռեգրեսիայի մոդելների հետ և նրանց ազդեցությամբ պաշտոնական արդյունքների կանխատեսման վրա և համալրացնում ենք մեր հետազոտությունը գերմաներեն լեզու էլեկտրոնային էլեկտրոնային էլեկտրոնայի', 'id': 'Untuk melacak tingkat formalitas yang berbeda dalam pidato tertulis, kami memperkenalkan tipe baru leksikon untuk bahasa Jerman, dengan entri yang diperintahkan oleh tingkat (in)formalitas mereka. Kita mulai dengan set kata-kata yang diekstraksi dari sumber daya lexikografi tradisional, memperluasnya dengan perhitungan persamaan berdasarkan kalimat, dan biarkan para pekerja keramaian menilai set lengkap benda-benda lexik pada skala informal-formal terus menerus sebagai standar emas untuk evaluasi. Kami mengirimkan lexikon ini ke evaluasi intrinsik yang berhubungan dengan model regresi terbaik dan efek mereka pada prediksi skor formalitas dan menambahkan penyelidikan kami dengan evaluasi ekstrinis formalitas pada korpus email bahasa Jerman.', 'bs': 'Da bi pratili različite nivoe formalnosti u pisanim diskusijama, predstavljamo novi tip leksikona za njemački jezik, sa ulazima naređenim po njihovom stupnju (in)formalnosti. Počinjemo sa gomilom riječi izvlačenih iz tradicionalnih leksikografskih resursa, proširimo ga računalima sličnosti na rečenici, i dopustimo da ljudi procjenjuju prošireni set leksičkih predmeta na neprestano neformalnom i formalnom skali kao zlatni standard za procjenu. Predajemo ovaj leksikon unutrašnjoj procjeni povezanoj sa najboljim modelima regresije i njihovim učinkom na predviđanje rezultata formalnosti i dodajemo našu istragu ekstriničkom procjenom formalnosti na njemačkom e-mailskom korpusu.', 'bn': 'লিখিত কথোপকথনে বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন স্তর অনুসন্ধান করার জন্য আমরা জার্মান ভাষার জন্য একটি লেক্সিকোন ধরনের লেক্সিকোনের পরিচালনা কর আমরা ঐতিহ্যবাহী লেক্সিকোগ্রাফিক সম্পদ থেকে বেরিয়ে যাওয়া বেশ কিছু শব্দ দিয়ে শুরু করি, শাস্তি ভিত্তিক একই ধরনের গণনা দ্বারা এটি বৃদ্ধি করে দেই এবং জনশ্রমিকদের মূল্যের জন্য আমরা এই লেক্সিকোনকে সেরা নিয়ন্ত্রণ মডেলের সাথে সম্পর্কিত ভিন্ন ভিত্তিক মূল্যায়নের প্রতি প্রদান করি এবং তাদের প্রভাব জার্মান-ভাষার ইমেইল কোর্পাসের উপর ফরমানি', 'ca': 'Per seguir diferents nivells de formalitat en discurs escrit, introduim un nou tipus de lexicó per a la llengua alemana, amb entrades ordenades pel seu grau de formalitat. We start with a set of words extracted from traditional lexicographic resources, extend it by sentence-based similarity computations, and let crowdworkers assess the enlarged set of lexical items on a continuous informal-formal scale as a gold standard for evaluation.  Ens submetem aquest lexicó a una evaluació intrínseca relacionada amb els millors models de regressió i el seu efecte en predir puntuacions de formalitat i complementar la nostra investigació amb una evaluació extrínsica de formalitat en un corpus de correus electrònics de llengua alemana.', 'cs': 'Abychom sledovali různé úrovně formality v písemném diskurzu, představujeme nový typ slovníku pro německý jazyk, s položkami uspořádanými podle stupně (in)formality. Začneme sadou slov extrahovaných z tradičních lexikografických zdrojů, rozšíříme ji o větové podobnostní výpočty a necháme crowdworkerům posoudit rozšířenou sadu lexikálních položek v kontinuálním neformálním měřítku jako zlatý standard pro hodnocení. Tento lexikon podáváme vnitřnímu hodnocení týkajícímu se nejlepších regresních modelů a jejich vlivu na predikci skóre formality a doplňujeme naše šetření extrinzickým hodnocením formality na německy jazykovém e-mailovém korpusu.', 'et': 'Kirjaliku diskursuse formaalsuse erinevate tasemete jälgimiseks tutvustame saksa keele uudset tüüpi leksikoni, mille kirjed on järjestatud vastavalt (in)formaalsuse tasemele. Alustame traditsioonilistest leksikograafilistest ressurssidest eraldatud sõnadest, laiendame seda lausepõhiste sarnasuse arvutustega ja laseme ühistöötajatel hinnata laiendatud leksikaalsete elementide kogumit pidevas mitteametlikus-formaalses skaalas kui hindamise kuldstandardit. Anname selle sõnastiku sisemisele hindamisele, mis on seotud parimate regressioonimudelite ja nende mõjuga formaalsusskooride prognoosimisele, ning täiendame oma uurimistööd saksakeelse e-posti korpuse formaalsuse välise hindamisega.', 'fi': 'Kirjallisen diskurssin muodollisuuden eri tasojen seuraamiseksi esittelemme saksalaiselle kielelle uudenlaisen sanaston, jossa merkinnät on järjestetty (in)muodollisuuden asteen mukaan. Aloitamme perinteisistä leksikografisista resursseista poimituista sanoista, laajennamme sitä lausepohjaisilla samankaltaisuuslaskennoilla ja annamme joukkotyöläisten arvioida laajennettua leksikografisten kohteiden joukkoa jatkuvalla epävirallisella asteikolla kultaisena arviointistandardina. Toimitamme tämän sanaston sisäiseen arviointiin liittyen parhaisiin regressiomalleihin ja niiden vaikutukseen muodollisuuspisteiden ennustamiseen ja täydennämme tutkimustamme ulkopuolisella arvioinnilla muodollisuudesta saksankielisessä sähköpostikorpusessa.', 'jv': 'Ngawe nyimpen langkung sampeyan operasi kanggo tukang mrogram sing pisan bangsane, awak dh챕w챕 nggawe tarjamahan kanggo langkung alam kuwi, nganggo dolanan sing ujaran dh챕w챕 (liyane) Awak dh챕w챕 mulai karo akeh gambar sing nggambar luwih akeh penyanusul luwih dumateng, ndheke awak dh챕w챕 kuwi Manual sing basa gambar nggambar obah-obahan Awak dh챕w챕 nglanggar lex챔k챕 iki dadi cara-cara sing nggawe gerakan karo model r챕glem sing luwih n챗m챗n karo nggawe geraran챕 dh챕w챕 cara-cara sing n챗m챗n lan nambah dh챕w챕 nggawe tarjamahan kanggo ngerasai perusahaan winih dh챕w챕.', 'he': 'כדי לעקוב אחר רמות שונות של רשמיות בתנאי כתוב, אנחנו מציגים סוג רומן של לקסיקון לשפה הגרמנית, עם הכתבים המזמינים על ידי רמת (in)רשמיות שלהם. אנו מתחילים עם קבוצת מילים שמוצאות משאבים לקסיקוגרפיים מסורתיים, להאריך אותה על ידי חישובים דומים מבוססים על משפטים, ולתת לעובדים הקהל להעריך את קבוצת הפרטים הלקסיים המורחבת בסולם פורמלי-פורמלי ממשיך כסטנדרט זהב להערכה. אנו שולחים את הלקסיקון הזה לערכה פנימית קשורה לדוגמנים הטובים ביותר של התחזור וההשפעה שלהם על חיזוי נקודות רשמיות ומלאים את החקירה שלנו על ידי עריכה חיצונית של רשמיות על גופוס דואר אלקטרוני בשפה גרמנית.', 'ha': "Formity Tuna fara da wasu kalmõmi wanda aka samar da shi daga wurãren lasiko na zamani, kuma Mu shimfiɗa shi da lissafi masu daidaita a ga cewa, kuma za'a yarda ga masu aikin mutane su ƙaddara ko da aka faɗa ko da wasu abubuwa na leksisi a kan wata takarda na daidai ba da rasmi ba. Munã aika wannan leksisi zuwa wani evaluci na ƙari wanda yake yi related to mafi kyaun misãlai na regression, da matsayinsu kan bashirin score formalite kuma ya cika ƙidãyayya a kanzu kanzu ta bakin zartarwa a kan jeruman.", 'bo': 'To track different levels of formality in written discourse, we introduce a new type of lexicon for the German language, with entries ordered by their degree of (in)formality. ང་ཚོས་སྔོན་གྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་འདི་ལས་ཕར་བསྐྱེད་པའི་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་ཟམ་གཙོ་རིམ་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་གཙོ་ཆེ་མཐོང་མཁན་དང་ཁོང་ཚོའི་དབུགས་རིམ་མཐོང་སྣང་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པ་དང་རྒྱས་ཐག', 'sk': 'Za sledenje različnih stopenj formalnosti v pisnem diskurzu predstavljamo nov tip leksikona za nemški jezik, z vnosi, ki so urejeni po stopnji (in)formalnosti. Začnemo z naborom besed, pridobljenih iz tradicionalnih leksikografskih virov, ga razširimo z izračuni podobnosti na podlagi stavkov in dovolimo, da množični delavci ocenijo razširjeni nabor leksikalnih elementov na neprekinjeni neformalni lestvici kot zlati standard za vrednotenje. Ta leksikon predložimo v notranjo vrednotenje, povezano z najboljšimi regresijskimi modeli in njihovim učinkom na napovedovanje ocen formalnosti, našo raziskavo pa dopolnjujemo z zunanjo vrednotenjem formalnosti na nemškem e-poštnem korpusu.'}
{'en': 'Probing into the Root : A Dataset for Reason Extraction of Structural Events from Financial Documents', 'ar': 'التحقيق في الجذر: مجموعة بيانات لأسباب استخلاص الأحداث الهيكلية من المستندات المالية', 'pt': 'Sondando na raiz: um conjunto de dados para extração de motivos de eventos estruturais de documentos financeiros', 'fr': "Exploration de la racine\xa0: un ensemble de données pour l'extraction de motifs d'événements structurels à partir de documents financiers", 'es': 'Explorando la raíz: un conjunto de datos para la extracción de la razón de eventos estructurales de los documentos financieros', 'zh': '究根:取财文档数集', 'ja': '根源的な調査：財務文書から構造的事象を抽出する理由のためのデータセット', 'hi': 'रूट में जांच: वित्तीय दस्तावेजों से संरचनात्मक घटनाओं के कारण निष्कर्षण के लिए एक डेटासेट', 'ru': 'Probing into the Root: Набор данных для обоснования извлечения структурных событий из финансовых документов', 'ga': 'Iniúchadh ar an bhFréamh: Tacar Sonraí ar Chúis a Bhaineann Teagmhais Struchtúrtha as Doiciméid Airgeadais', 'hu': 'Vizsgálat a gyökerbe: a strukturális események pénzügyi dokumentumokból történő kivonásához szükséges adatkészlet', 'el': 'Έλεγχος στη ρίζα: Ένα σύνολο δεδομένων για λόγους εξαγωγή διαρθρωτικών γεγονότων από οικονομικά έγγραφα', 'it': "Sondare alla radice: un set di dati per l'estrazione ragionata di eventi strutturali dai documenti finanziari", 'lt': 'Išbandymas į šaknį: struktūrinių įvykių ištraukimo iš finansinių dokumentų priežasčių duomenų rinkinys', 'mk': 'Проверка во коренот: Податоци за извлекување причини на структурни настани од финансиските документи', 'ka': 'კონფინციური დოკუმენტების გამოყენება', 'ml': 'മൂലങ്ങളിലേക്ക് പ്രോബിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'kk': 'Түпнұсқасына тексеру: Қаржылы құжаттардан структуралық оқиғаларды тарқату себептерінің деректер бағдарламасы', 'mn': 'Санхүүгийн бичил баримтуудаас бүтэц үйл явдлуудын шалтгаан өгөгдлийн сан', 'no': 'Prøver inn i roten: Databasen for grunn utpakking av strukturelle hendingar frå finansielle dokument', 'pl': 'Badanie w korzeni: Zestaw danych z powodu Ekstrakcja zdarzeń strukturalnych z dokumentów finansowych', 'ms': 'Mencoba ke dalam Root: Dataset untuk Ekstraksi Alasan Peristiwa Struktur dari Dokumen Kewangan', 'ro': 'Sondarea în rădăcină: un set de date pentru extragerea de motive a evenimentelor structurale din documentele financiare', 'sr': 'Proba u koricu: Datata za izvlačenje strukturalnih događaja iz finansijskih dokumenta', 'so': 'Meel ka soo gala Root: A Dataset for Extraction of Events Structural From Documenties Financial', 'si': 'රූට් වලට පරීක්ෂණා කරන්න: හේතුවක් නිර්මාණය සඳහා සංවිධානය සම්බන්ධ විස්තාරයක් නිර්මාණය', 'sv': 'Undersökning i roten: En dataset för skäl extraktion av strukturella händelser från finansiella dokument', 'mt': 'Prova fl-għeruq: Sett ta’ Dejta għal Raġunijiet ta’ Estrazzjoni ta’ Avvenimenti Strutturali mid-Dokumenti Finanzjarji', 'ta': 'மூலத்திற்குள் செலுத்தப்படுகிறது', 'ur': 'روٹ میں امتحان کرنا: فنانسی دکھانیوں سے ساخترال ایڈمنٹوں کے واسطے ایک ڈیٹس', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đang xác định nguồn gốc: A dữ liệu về biện pháp rút ra cấu trúc các sự kiện từ tài chính', 'bg': 'Проучване в корена: набор от данни за извличане на причини за структурни събития от финансови документи', 'nl': 'Proberen in de wortel: Een Dataset voor Redenen Extractie van Structurele Gebeurtenissen uit Financiële Documenten', 'da': 'Undersøgelse i roden: Et datasæt til årsag udtrækning af strukturelle begivenheder fra finansielle dokumenter', 'hr': 'Istraživanje u korijenu: Datata za izvlačenje strukturnih događaja iz financijskih dokumenta', 'de': 'Stichprobe in die Wurzel: Ein Datensatz aus Gründen Extraktion von Strukturereignissen aus Finanzdokumenten', 'fa': 'تحقیق در ریشه: یک داده\u200cای برای اخراج دلایل اتفاقات ساختاری از سند\u200cهای مالی', 'ko': '루트 탐색: 금융 파일에서 구조적 사건의 원인 데이터 집합 추출', 'id': 'Mencoba ke Root: Sebuah Dataset untuk alasan ekstraksi peristiwa struktur dari Dokumen Finanzial', 'sw': 'Kuingia katika Root: Taarifa kwa sababu ya kuondolewa kwa matukio ya Miundombinu kutoka katika nyaraka za kifedha', 'af': "Probeer in die Root: 'n Databasis vir rede uittrek van strukturele gebeurtenis van Finansiedokumente", 'sq': 'Duke provuar në rrënjë: Një bazë të dhënash për arsyet e nxjerrjes së ngjarjeve strukturore nga dokumentet financiare', 'am': 'A Dataset for reason to extract structural events from Financial Documents', 'tr': 'Probing into the Root: A Dataset for Reason Extraction of Structural Events from Financial Documents', 'bn': 'রুটে প্রবেশ করা হচ্ছে: অর্থনৈতিক ডকুমেন্ট থেকে কৌশল বিনিময়ের জন্য একটি ডাটাসেট', 'az': 'İşlənmək: Finanlı Dökümələrdən Struktural Vaqiaların Çıkarması üçün bir Dataset', 'hy': 'Փորձել արմատին. Ֆինանսական փաստաթղթերից կառուցվածքային իրադարձությունների հեռացման պատճառի տվյալներ', 'ca': "Probar a l'arrel: Un conjunt de dades per raons d'extracció d'esdeveniments estructurals dels documents financers", 'bs': 'Istraživanje u korijenu: Datata za izvlačenje strukturalnih događaja iz financijskih dokumenta', 'cs': 'Snímání do kořene: Datová sada pro důvod extrakce strukturálních událostí z finančních dokumentů', 'fi': 'Tutkitaan juuria: Perustieto rakenteellisten tapahtumien purkamisesta taloudellisista asiakirjoista', 'et': 'Juure uurimine: andmekogum struktuurisündmuste väljavõtmiseks finantsdokumentidest', 'sk': 'Prodiranje v koren: nabor podatkov za izvleček razlogov strukturnih dogodkov iz finančnih dokumentov', 'he': 'מחקר אל השורש: קבוצת נתונים לסיבות להוציא אירועים מבניינים ממסמכים פיננסיים', 'jv': 'You are about to test the Root: A dataacet for Region extract of structural events from Finance documents', 'ha': 'Yi shiga Rufe: A Dataset for Extracti Sura na Kwamfyutan Aiki daga Takardun Aiki', 'bo': 'Probing into the Root: A Dataset for Reason Extraction of Structural Events from Financial Documents'}
{'en': 'This paper proposes a new task regarding event reason extraction from document-level texts. Unlike the previous causality detection task, we do not assign target events in the text, but only provide structural event descriptions, and such settings accord more with practice scenarios. Moreover, we annotate a large dataset FinReason for evaluation, which provides Reasons annotation for Financial events in company announcements. This task is challenging because the cases of multiple-events, multiple-reasons, and implicit-reasons are included. In total, FinReason contains 8,794 documents, 12,861 financial events and 11,006 reason spans. We also provide the performance of existing canonical methods in event extraction and machine reading comprehension on this task. The results show a 7 percentage point F1 score gap between the best model and human performance, and existing methods are far from resolving this problem.', 'ar': 'تقترح هذه الورقة مهمة جديدة فيما يتعلق باستخراج سبب الحدث من نصوص على مستوى الوثيقة. على عكس مهمة اكتشاف السببية السابقة ، لا نقوم بتعيين الأحداث المستهدفة في النص ، ولكننا نقدم فقط أوصافًا للحدث الهيكلي ، وتتوافق هذه الإعدادات بشكل أكبر مع سيناريوهات الممارسة. علاوة على ذلك ، قمنا بتعليق مجموعة بيانات كبيرة FinReason للتقييم ، والتي توفر شرحًا توضيحيًا لأسباب الأحداث المالية في إعلانات الشركة. هذه المهمة صعبة لأنه تم تضمين حالات الأحداث المتعددة ، والأسباب المتعددة ، والأسباب الضمنية. في المجموع ، يحتوي FinReason على 8794 مستندًا و 12861 حدثًا ماليًا و 11006 نطاق أسباب. نوفر أيضًا أداء الأساليب المتعارف عليها الموجودة في استخلاص الأحداث وفهم قراءة الآلة في هذه المهمة. تظهر النتائج فجوة في درجة 7 نقاط مئوية في F1 بين أفضل نموذج والأداء البشري ، والأساليب الحالية بعيدة كل البعد عن حل هذه المشكلة.', 'fr': "Cet article propose une nouvelle tâche concernant l'extraction de la raison d'un événement à partir de textes au niveau du document. Contrairement à la tâche précédente de détection de causalité, nous n'attribuons pas d'événements cibles dans le texte, mais nous fournissons uniquement des descriptions d'événements structurels, et ces paramètres s'accordent davantage avec les scénarios d'exercices pratiques. De plus, nous annotons un grand ensemble de données FinReason for evaluation, qui fournit une annotation Reasons pour les événements financiers dans les annonces de l'entreprise. Cette tâche est difficile car les cas d'événements multiples, de raisons multiples et de raisons implicites sont inclus. Au total, FinReason contient 8 794 documents, 12 861 événements financiers et 11 006 périodes de motifs. Nous fournissons également la performance des méthodes canoniques existantes dans l'extraction d'événements et la compréhension de la lecture automatique sur cette tâche. Les résultats montrent un écart de 7 points de pourcentage entre le meilleur modèle et la performance humaine, et les méthodes existantes sont loin de résoudre ce problème.", 'es': 'Este artículo propone una nueva tarea con respecto a la extracción de motivos de eventos de textos a nivel de documento. A diferencia de la tarea de detección de causalidad anterior, no asignamos eventos objetivo en el texto, sino que solo proporcionamos descripciones de eventos estructurales, y dichos ajustes concuerdan más con los escenarios de práctica. Además, anotamos un gran conjunto de datos FinReason para la evaluación, que proporciona anotación de Motivos para eventos financieros en los anuncios de la empresa. Esta tarea es desafiante porque se incluyen los casos de eventos múltiples, razones múltiples y razones implícitas. En total, FinReason contiene 8,794 documentos, 12,861 eventos financieros y 11,006 intervalos de motivos. También proporcionamos el rendimiento de los métodos canónicos existentes en la extracción de eventos y la comprensión de lectura automática en esta tarea. Los resultados muestran una brecha de puntuación F1 de 7 puntos porcentuales entre el mejor modelo y el rendimiento humano, y los métodos existentes están lejos de resolver este problema.', 'pt': 'Este artigo propõe uma nova tarefa sobre extração de razão de evento de textos em nível de documento. Ao contrário da tarefa de detecção de causalidade anterior, não atribuímos eventos-alvo no texto, mas apenas fornecemos descrições de eventos estruturais, e essas configurações estão mais de acordo com os cenários de prática. Além disso, anotamos um grande conjunto de dados FinReason para avaliação, que fornece a anotação de motivos para eventos financeiros em anúncios da empresa. Essa tarefa é desafiadora porque os casos de eventos múltiplos, razões múltiplas e razões implícitas estão incluídos. No total, FinReason contém 8.794 documentos, 12.861 eventos financeiros e 11.006 períodos de razão. Também fornecemos o desempenho de métodos canônicos existentes na extração de eventos e compreensão de leitura de máquina nesta tarefa. Os resultados mostram uma diferença de pontuação F1 de 7 pontos percentuais entre o melhor modelo e o desempenho humano, e os métodos existentes estão longe de resolver esse problema.', 'ja': '本稿では、文書レベルのテキストからの事象理由抽出に関する新しいタスクを提案する。以前の因果関係検出タスクとは異なり、テキストにターゲットイベントを割り当てるのではなく、構造的なイベント記述のみを提供し、そのような設定は練習シナリオにより適合します。さらに、評価のために大きなデータセットFinReasonに注釈を付けます。これは、会社の発表で財務イベントの理由注釈を提供します。このタスクは、複数のイベント、複数の理由、および暗黙の理由のケースが含まれているため、困難です。FinReasonには、合計で8,794件の書類、12,861件の金融イベント、11,006件の理由スパンが含まれています。また、このタスクでは、イベント抽出および機械読解における既存の正準法のパフォーマンスも提供します。結果は、最良のモデルと人間のパフォーマンスとの間に7パーセントのF 1スコアギャップを示しており、既存の方法はこの問題の解決には程遠い。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर दस्तावेज़-स्तर के ग्रंथों से ईवेंट कारण निष्कर्षण के बारे में एक नया कार्य प्रस्तावित करता है। पिछले कार्य-कारण का पता लगाने के कार्य के विपरीत, हम पाठ में लक्ष्य ईवेंट असाइन नहीं करते हैं, लेकिन केवल संरचनात्मक घटना विवरण प्रदान करते हैं, और ऐसी सेटिंग्स अभ्यास परिदृश्यों के साथ अधिक मेल खाती हैं। इसके अलावा, हम मूल्यांकन के लिए एक बड़े डेटासेट FinReason को एनोटेट करते हैं, जो कंपनी की घोषणाओं में वित्तीय घटनाओं के लिए कारण एनोटेशन प्रदान करता है। यह कार्य चुनौतीपूर्ण है क्योंकि एकाधिक-घटनाओं, एकाधिक-कारणों और अंतर्निहित-कारणों के मामले शामिल हैं. कुल मिलाकर, FinReason में 8,794 दस्तावेज, 12,861 वित्तीय घटनाएं और 11,006 कारण spans शामिल हैं। हम इस कार्य पर घटना निष्कर्षण और मशीन पढ़ने की समझ में मौजूदा विहित विधियों का प्रदर्शन भी प्रदान करते हैं। परिणाम सबसे अच्छे मॉडल और मानव प्रदर्शन के बीच 7 प्रतिशत अंक F1 स्कोर अंतर दिखाते हैं, और मौजूदा तरीके इस समस्या को हल करने से बहुत दूर हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье предлагается новая задача, касающаяся извлечения причины события из текстов на уровне документа. В отличие от предыдущей задачи определения причинно-следственной связи, мы не назначаем целевые события в тексте, а только предоставляем структурные описания событий, и такие настройки больше соответствуют практическим сценариям. Кроме того, мы аннотируем большой набор данных FinReason для оценки, который предоставляет аннотацию причин для финансовых событий в объявлениях компании. Эта задача является сложной, поскольку в нее включены случаи множественных событий, множественных причин и неявных причин. В общей сложности FinReason содержит 8 794 документа, 12 861 финансовое событие и 11 006 причинно-следственных связей. Мы также обеспечиваем выполнение существующих канонических методов в извлечении событий и понимании машинного чтения по этой задаче. Результаты показывают 7-процентный разрыв в баллах F1 между лучшей моделью и производительностью человека, и существующие методы далеки от решения этой проблемы.', 'zh': '本文条上文档级文本新事。 与前果检事不同,不在文本中分向事,但供结构化事,更合践履。 此外注大率据集FinReason评估,该数集为公司公告中财务事给其故注。 其事有挑战性,以多故隐式之。 FinReason凡包8,794份文件,12,861起财11,006其故跨度。 又于事取机器读取解,供见法之性。 结果显示至数相去F1为7百分点,今远未之解也。', 'ga': 'Molann an páipéar seo tasc nua maidir le baint ó théacsanna ar leibhéal na gcáipéisí de bharr imeachtaí. Murab ionann agus an tasc braite cúisíochta roimhe seo, ní dhéanaimid sprioc-imeachtaí a shannadh sa téacs, ní chuirimid ar fáil ach cur síos ar imeachtaí struchtúracha, agus tagann socruithe dá leithéid le cásanna cleachtais níos mó. Ina theannta sin, déanaimid anótáil ar thacar sonraí mór FinReason le haghaidh meastóireachta, a sholáthraíonn anótáil Cúiseanna le haghaidh imeachtaí Airgeadais i bhfógraí cuideachta. Tá an tasc seo dúshlánach mar go gcuirtear cásanna iolracha, cúiseanna iolracha agus cúiseanna intuigthe san áireamh. San iomlán, tá 8,794 doiciméad, 12,861 imeacht airgeadais agus 11,006 réimse fáthanna ag FinReason. Soláthraímid freisin feidhmíocht na modhanna canónacha atá ann cheana féin maidir le heastóscadh imeachtaí agus le tuiscint meaisín-léitheoireachta ar an tasc seo. Léiríonn na torthaí bearna scór 7 pointe céatadáin F1 idir an tsamhail is fearr agus feidhmíocht dhaonna, agus tá na modhanna atá ann cheana féin i bhfad ó réiteach na faidhbe seo.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány új feladatot javasol az eseményok dokumentumszintű szövegekből történő kivonásával kapcsolatban. Az előző okozati összefüggések felismerésével ellentétben a szövegben nem rendelünk céleseményeket, hanem csak strukturális eseményleírásokat, és ezek a beállítások jobban összhangban vannak a gyakorlati forgatókönyvekkel. Ezenkívül egy nagy FinReason adatkészletet jegyzetelünk meg az értékeléshez, amely a pénzügyi események okainak jegyzetelését biztosítja a vállalati hirdetményekben. Ez a feladat kihívást jelent, mert a többszörös események, többszörös okok és implicit okok eseteit is tartalmazzák. A FinReason összesen 8 794 dokumentumot, 12 861 pénzügyi eseményt és 11 006 oktartományt tartalmaz. Ezen kívül biztosítjuk a meglévő kanonikus módszerek végrehajtását az eseménykivonás és a gépi olvasás megértése során. Az eredmények 7 százalékpontos F1 pontszám eltérést mutatnak a legjobb modell és az emberi teljesítmény között, és a meglévő módszerek messze nem oldják meg ezt a problémát.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει μια νέα εργασία σχετικά με την εξαγωγή αιτίων συμβάντος από κείμενα σε επίπεδο εγγράφου. Σε αντίθεση με την προηγούμενη εργασία ανίχνευσης αιτιώδους συσχέτισης, δεν αντιστοιχούμε συμβάντα στόχων στο κείμενο, αλλά παρέχουμε μόνο περιγραφές δομικών συμβάντων και τέτοιες ρυθμίσεις συμφωνούν περισσότερο με σενάρια πρακτικής. Επιπλέον, σχολιάζουμε ένα μεγάλο σύνολο δεδομένων το οποίο παρέχει σχολιασμό λόγων για οικονομικά γεγονότα στις ανακοινώσεις της εταιρείας. Αυτή η εργασία είναι πρόκληση επειδή περιλαμβάνονται οι περιπτώσεις πολλαπλών γεγονότων, πολλαπλών λόγων και έμμεσων λόγων. Συνολικά, περιέχει 8,794 έγγραφα, 12,861 οικονομικά γεγονότα και 11,006 χρονικά διαστήματα. Παρέχουμε επίσης την εκτέλεση υφιστάμενων κανονικών μεθόδων εξαγωγής γεγονότων και κατανόησης μηχανικής ανάγνωσης σε αυτό το έργο. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ένα χάσμα βαθμολογίας επτά ποσοστών μεταξύ του καλύτερου μοντέλου και της ανθρώπινης απόδοσης, και οι υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι απέχουν πολύ από την επίλυση αυτού του προβλήματος.', 'it': "Questo articolo propone un nuovo compito riguardante l'estrazione della ragione degli eventi da testi a livello di documento. A differenza del precedente compito di rilevamento della causalità, non attribuiamo eventi target nel testo, ma forniamo solo descrizioni di eventi strutturali e tali impostazioni si accordano maggiormente con gli scenari di pratica. Inoltre, annotiamo un ampio set di dati FinReason per la valutazione, che fornisce annotazioni Motivi per eventi finanziari negli annunci aziendali. Questo compito è impegnativo perché sono inclusi i casi di eventi multipli, motivi multipli e motivi impliciti. In totale, FinReason contiene 8.794 documenti, 12.861 eventi finanziari e 11.006 intervalli di ragione. Forniamo anche l'esecuzione di metodi canonici esistenti in estrazione di eventi e comprensione della lettura automatica su questo compito. I risultati mostrano un divario di 7 punti percentuali tra il modello migliore e le prestazioni umane, e i metodi esistenti sono lungi dall'risolvere questo problema.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūloma nauja užduotis, susijusi su įvykio priežasčių ištraukimu iš dokumentų lygio tekstų. Priešingai nei ankstesnė priežastinio ryšio nustatymo užduotis, tekste nenurodomi tiksliniai įvykiai, bet pateikiami tik struktūriniai įvykių aprašymai, ir tokie nustatymai labiau atitinka praktinius scenarijus. Be to, mes anotuojame didelį duomenų rinkinį „FinReason“ vertinimui, kuriame pateikiama „Reasons“ finansinių įvykių anotacija bendrovės pranešimuose. This task is challenging because the cases of multiple-events, multiple-reasons, and implicit-reasons are included.  Iš viso FinReason sudėtyje yra 8 794 dokumentų, 12 861 finansinių įvykių ir 11 006 priežasčių intervalų. Mes taip pat teikiame esamų kanoniškų metodų veiksmingumą renginių ekstrahavimo ir mašininio skaitymo supratimo šioje užduotyje. Rezultatai rodo, kad geriausio modelio ir žmogaus veiklos rezultatų F1 rezultatų skirtumas yra 7 procentiniais punktais, o esami metodai šioje problemoje dar nėra išspręsti.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз оқиға себептерін құжат деңгейіндегі мәтіндерден тарқату үшін жаңа тапсырманы ұсынады. Алдыңғы себептердің тапсырмасын анықтау тапсырмасына сәйкес, біз мәтінде мақсатты оқиғаларды тапсырмаймыз, бірақ тек құрылғы оқиғалардың сипаттамаларын тапсырмаймыз, және ос Сонымен қатар, біз FinReason бағалау үшін үлкен деректер жинағын жазып береміз. Бұл компанияның жарияларында "Reasons for Financial Events" жарияларын жазып береді. Бұл тапсырма бірнеше оқиғалар, бірнеше себептері және негізгі себептері қосылған. Жалпы FinReason 8 794 құжат, 12 861 қаржылық оқиғалар және 11 006 себептердің арасында. Біз сондай-ақ бұл тапсырманы тарқату және машинаның оқу түсініктерінде бар каноникалық әдістердің істемін береміз. Нәтижелер F1 деген ең жақсы модел мен адамның істеу арасындағы 7 пайыздық нүктесін көрсетеді, және бар әдістер бұл мәселеді шешуден тыс.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini melamar tugas baru mengenai ekstraksi sebab peristiwa dari teks aras dokumen. Tidak seperti tugas pengesan penyebab sebelumnya, kami tidak menulis peristiwa sasaran dalam teks, tetapi hanya menyediakan deskripsi peristiwa struktur, dan tetapan tersebut lebih sesuai dengan skenario latihan. Selain itu, kami anot set data besar FinReason untuk penilaian, yang menyediakan Reasons annotation untuk peristiwa kewangan dalam pengumuman syarikat. Tugas ini mencabar kerana kes-peristiwa berbilang, sebab-berbilang, dan sebab-implicit termasuk. Jumlahnya, FinReason mengandungi 8,794 dokumen, 12,861 peristiwa kewangan dan 11,006 jangkauan alasan. We also provide the performance of existing canonical methods in event extraction and machine reading comprehension on this task.  Hasilnya menunjukkan jarak skor F1 7 poin antara model terbaik dan prestasi manusia, dan kaedah yang wujud jauh dari memecahkan masalah ini.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jipproponi kompitu ġdid rigward l-estrazzjoni tar-raġunijiet tal-avveniment minn testi fil-livell tad-dokument. Għall-kuntrarju tal-kompitu preċedenti ta’ identifikazzjoni tal-kawżalità, ma nassenjawx avvenimenti fil-mira fit-test, iżda jipprovdu biss deskrizzjonijiet strutturali tal-avvenimenti, u tali konfigurazzjonijiet jaqblu aktar max-xenarji prattiċi. Barra minn hekk, a ħna nnotaw sett kbir ta’ dejta FinReason għall-evalwazzjoni, li jipprovdi Raġunijiet annotazzjoni għal avvenimenti finanzjarji fi tħabbir tal-kumpanija. Dan il-kompitu huwa ta’ sfida għaliex il-każijiet ta’ avvenimenti multipli, raġunijiet multipli u raġunijiet impliċiti huma inklużi. B’kollox, FinReason fih 8,794 dokument, 12,861 avveniment finanzjarju u 11,006 firxa ta’ raġunijiet. Aħna nipprovdu wkoll il-prestazzjoni ta’ metodi kanoniċi eżistenti f’każ ta’ estrazzjoni u fehim tal-qari bil-magna dwar dan il-kompitu. Ir-riżultati juru differenza fil-punteġġ F1 ta’ 7 punti perċentwali bejn l-a ħjar mudell u l-prestazzjoni umana, u l-metodi eżistenti għadhom ’il bogħod milli jsolvu din il-problem a.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ ജോലി പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു മുമ്പുള്ള കാരണങ്ങളുടെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പോലെയുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേര്\u200dതിരിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ലക്ഷ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നില് അതുകൊണ്ടും, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു വലിയ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് സെറ്റ് വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് കമ്പനിയിലെ പ്രഖ്യാപന പ ഈ ജോലി ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നത് കാരണം പല സംഭവങ്ങളുടെയും പല കാരണങ്ങളുടെയും കേസുകള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dന്നിരിക്കുന്നു. മൊത്തത്തില്\u200d, കാരണം 8,794 രേഖകള്\u200d, 12,861 സാമ്പത്തിക സംഭവങ്ങളും 11,006 കാരണം പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള കാനോണിക്കല്\u200d രീതികളുടെ പ്രദര്\u200dശനത്തിനും മെഷീന്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നതിനുമുമ്പ് നമ്മള്\u200d നി അതിന്റെ ഫലം 7 ശതമാന പോയിന്\u200dറ് F1 സ്കോര്\u200d തമ്മിലുള്ള മോഡലും മനുഷ്യരുടെ പ്രകടനത്തിനും തമ്മിലുള്ള വ്യത്യാസവും കാണിക്കുന്ന', 'mk': 'Овој документ предлага нова задача во врска со извлекувањето на причината за настанот од текстот на ниво на документ. За разлика од претходната задача за детекција на причината, ние не ги додаваме метните настани во текстот, туку само обезбедуваме структурни описи на настаните, и ваквите поставувања се повеќе во согласност со практичните сценарија. Покрај тоа, анотираме голем компјутер податоци FinReason за проценка, кој обезбедува анотирање на причините за финансиските настани во објавувањата на претпријатието. Оваа задача е предизвикувачка бидејќи се вклучени случаите на повеќекратни настани, повеќекратни причини и имплицитни причини. Вкупно, FinReason содржи 8.794 документи, 12.861 финансиски настани и 11.006 причини. Ние, исто така, обезбедуваме изведба на постојните канонички методи во извлекување на случаи и машинско читање разбирање за оваа задача. Резултатите покажуваат разлика во оценката од 7 процентни поени Ф1 помеѓу најдобриот модел и човечката перформанса, а постоечките методи се далеку од решавање на овој проблем.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł proponuje nowe zadanie dotyczące ekstrakcji przyczyn zdarzeń z tekstów na poziomie dokumentu. W przeciwieństwie do poprzedniego zadania wykrywania związków przyczynowych, nie przypisujemy zdarzeń docelowych w tekście, a tylko opisy zdarzeń strukturalnych, a takie ustawienia są bardziej zgodne ze scenariuszami praktyki. Ponadto adnotacja dużego zbioru danych FinReason do oceny, który zapewnia adnotację Powodów dla zdarzeń finansowych w ogłoszeniach firmy. To zadanie jest wyzwaniem, ponieważ uwzględnione są przypadki wielu zdarzeń, wielu powodów i domyślnych powodów. W sumie FinReason zawiera dokumenty 8,794, 12,861 zdarzenia finansowe i 11,006 rozszerzenia powodów. Zapewniamy również wykonanie istniejących metod kanonicznych w zakresie ekstrakcji zdarzeń i rozumienia odczytu maszynowego w tym zadaniu. Wyniki pokazują 7-procentową lukę wyników F1 pomiędzy najlepszym modelem a wydajnością człowieka, a istniejące metody dalekie są od rozwiązania tego problemu.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас баримт-түвшинд баримт-түвшинд гаргах шалтгааны тухай шинэ ажил санал болгодог. Өмнөх шалтгааныг тодорхойлох үйл ажиллагааны ялгаа, бид текст зориулсан үйл ажиллагааны үйл ажиллагааны үйл ажиллагааг тайлбарлахгүй, гэхдээ зөвхөн структур үйл ажиллагааны тодорхойлолтуудыг тайлбарла Үүний дараа бид компанийн хэлэлцээнд санхүүгийн үйл явдлуудын шалгалтын тулд том өгөгдлийн сангийн суурь FinReason-г анзаарч байна. Энэ даалгавар нь хэцүү, учир нь олон үйл явдал, олон шалтгаанууд, үндсэн шалтгаануудын тухай дүрслэгддэг. Нийтэд Финрейсон 8 794 баримт, 12 861 санхүүгийн үйл явдал, 11 006 шалтгаан нэмэгдэж байна. Мөн бид энэ үйл ажлын тухай ойлголт гаргах болон машины унших үйл ажиллагааны үйл ажиллагааг дамжуулдаг. Үүний үр дүнд F1-ийн 7 хувь цэг нь хамгийн сайн загвар болон хүн төрөлхтний үйл ажиллагааны хоорондын ялгааг харуулж байна. Харин суурь арга нь энэ асуудлыг шийдэхээс хол байдаг.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტის შესაძლებელია ახალი რაოდენობა მოვლენების მიზეზის ექსტრაქცია დოკუმენტის ტექსტიდან. პირველი მიზეზი განახლების განახლების პარამეტრებისგან, ჩვენ ტექსტის მიზეზი მოვლენების განმავლობას არ დავყენებთ, მაგრამ მხოლოდ სტრუქტური მოვლენების განახლებების განმავლობას დამატებით, ჩვენ აღწერეთ დიდი მონაცემების საზოგადომა FinReason, რომელიც განსაზოგადომის მიზეზების აღწერა ფინანციალური მოვლენების საზოგადოებში. ეს დავალება შესაძლებელია, რადგან რამდენიმე მოვლენების, რამდენიმე მიზეზების და ინფლიციტური მიზეზების შემთხვევაში. ყველაფერად, FinReason-ს აქვს 8 794 დოკუმენტები, 12 861 ფინასური მოვლენები და 11 006 მიზეზების გარეშე. ჩვენ ასევე კონონიკალური მეტების გამოსახულებას ექსტრაქციის და მაქინის კითხვის შესახებ ამ რაოდენობაზე. წარმოდგენები ჩვენებს 7 პროცენტის წარმოდგენების განსხვავება F1 წარმოდგენების შორის და ადამიანის მუშაობის განსხვავებაში, და მსგავსი წარმოდგენები ამ პრობლ', 'no': 'Denne papiret foreslår eit ny oppgåve om hendingsreglen utpakking frå dokumentnivåtekstar. I motsetjing av den førre grunnleggjande oppgåva, tilbyr vi ikkje målene i teksten, men berre tilbyr strukturære hendingskildringar, og slike innstillingar tilsvarar fleire øvingsscenarioar. I tillegg annoterar vi ein stor dataset FinReason for evaluering, som tilbyr Reasons annotasjon for Finansielle hendingar i selskapsannounceringar. Denne oppgåva er vanskeleg fordi tilfellene med fleire hendingar, fleire grunner og implisitte grunner er inkludert. FinReason inneheld totalt 8 794 dokument, 12 861 finansielle hendingar og 11,006 grunnslag. Vi tilbyr også utføringen av eksisterande kanoniske metodar i hendingar med utpakking og lesing av maskinen for denne oppgåva. Resultatet viser eit 7 prosentpunkt med F1-poeng mellom den beste modellen og menneske utviklinga, og eksisterande metodane er langt frå å løysinga av dette problemet.', 'ro': 'Lucrarea propune o nouă sarcină privind extragerea motivului evenimentului din texte la nivel de document. Spre deosebire de activitatea anterioară de detectare a cauzalității, nu atribuim evenimente țintă în text, ci furnizăm doar descrieri structurale ale evenimentelor, iar astfel de setări corespund mai mult scenariilor de practică. Mai mult decât atât, adnotăm un set mare de date FinReason pentru evaluare, care oferă adnotări Motive pentru evenimentele financiare în anunțurile companiei. Această sarcină este dificilă deoarece sunt incluse cazurile de evenimente multiple, motive multiple și motive implicite. În total, FinReason conține 8.794 documente, 12.861 evenimente financiare și 11.006 intervale de motive. Oferim, de asemenea, executarea metodelor canonice existente în extracția evenimentelor și înțelegerea citirii mașinilor pe această sarcină. Rezultatele arată un decalaj F1 de 7 puncte procentuale între cel mai bun model și performanța umană, iar metodele existente sunt departe de a rezolva această problemă.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predlaže novi zadatak u vezi izvlačenja razloga događaja iz teksta na nivou dokumenta. Za razliku od prethodnog zadatka otkrivanja uzrokovanja uzrokovanja, mi ne održavamo ciljne događaje u tekstu, već samo obezbeđujemo opise strukturnih događaja, i takve postavke se više slažu s scenarijama prakse. Osim toga, annotiramo veliku skupu podataka FinReason za procjenu, koja pruža annotaciju Reasona za finansijske događaje u objavama kompanije. Ovaj zadatak je izazovan jer su uključeni slučajevi višestrukih događaja, višestrukih razloga i implicitnih razloga. Ukupno, FinReason sadrži 8.794 dokumenta, 12.861 finansijskih događaja i 11.006 razloga. Takoðe pružamo provedbu postojeæih kanonièkih metoda u sluèaju izvlaèenja i razumijevanja mašina o ovom zadatku. Rezultati pokazuju prazninu 7 procentnih tački F1 rezultata između najboljih model a i ljudske funkcije, a postojećih metoda su daleko od rješavanja ovog problema.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අළුත් වැඩක් සඳහා සිද්ධිය හේතුවක් විසින් වැඩක් තියෙනවා විසින් විසින් ලේඛන-  මුලින් හොයාගන්න වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන්, අපි ලිපිනයේ ලක්ෂණ අවස්ථාවක් නෙවෙයි, නමුත් සංස්ථාවක අවස්ථාවක් විතරයි, ඒ ව තවත්, අපි ලොකු දත්ත සැට FinReason විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා, ඒකෙන් සමාගමේ විශ්ලේෂණයේ විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා හේතුවක් සඳහා අ මේ වැඩේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ, මොකද වැඩිය අවස්ථාවන්, වැඩිය හේතුවන්, සහ සම්පූර්ණ හේතුවන් සම්ප සම්පූර්ණයෙන්, FinReason සම්පූර්ණයෙන් 8,794 ලිපිණිය, 12,861 අධ්\u200dයාත්මක අවස්ථාවක් සහ 11,000කාරණාවක අපි ඒවගේම මේ වැඩේ තේරුම් ගන්න පුළුවන් කැනෝනිකල් විදිහට ප්\u200dරවෘත්ති කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා. ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ F1 ප්\u200dරතිශත්ත වින්දුවෙන් හොඳම මොඩල් සහ මිනිස්සු ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් අතර ඉන්න, සහ ඉන්', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats föreslår en ny uppgift gällande händelseorsak extraktion från dokument-nivå texter. Till skillnad från den tidigare uppgiften för att upptäcka orsakssamband tilldelar vi inte målhändelser i texten, utan tillhandahåller bara strukturella händelsebeskrivningar, och sådana inställningar överensstämmer mer med praxis scenarier. Dessutom kommenterar vi ett stort dataset FinReason för utvärdering, som ger motiveringar för finansiella händelser i företagsmeddelanden. Denna uppgift är utmanande eftersom fall av flera händelser, flera orsaker och underförstådda orsaker ingår. Totalt innehåller FinReason 8 794 dokument, 12 861 finansiella händelser och 11 006 årsintervall. Vi tillhandahåller även utförande av befintliga kanoniska metoder för händelseutvinning och maskinläsförståelse på denna uppgift. Resultaten visar ett F1-poänggap på 7 procentenheter mellan bästa modellen och mänsklig prestanda, och befintliga metoder är långt ifrån att lösa detta problem.', 'so': 'Warqaddaas wuxuu ka soo jeedaa shaqo cusub oo ku saabsan sababta dhacdooyinka laga soo bixiyo qoraalka saxda ee warqadda. Shaqooyinkii hore oo la kala duwan karo aragtida sababtu horay, marna qoraalka dhacdooyinka goalka ah kuma qeybinno, laakiin waxaa keliyahoo bixiya qoraalka dhacdooyinka dhaqdhaqaalaha, oo hababka oo kale waxay ku leedahay wax ka badan tababaro. Sidoo kale waxaynu ogeysiinnaa sababta qiimeynta Finnishka oo waaweyn, kaas oo sababta ay ka heleysaa ogeysiiska dhacdooyinka dhaqaalaha ee shirkadda. Shaqadaasu waa dhibaatooyin, sababtoo ah xaaladaha dhacdooyinka badan, sababo kala duduwan iyo sababaha aan cidhiidhinayn waxaa jira. Dhammaan Finnishka waxaa ku jira 8,794 dukumenti, 12,861 dhacdooyinka dhaqaalaha iyo 11,006 sabab. Waxaynu sidoo kale siinaynaa sameynta qaababka kanonika ah, marka la soo bixiyo iyo qoraalka lagu akhriyo mashiinka. Abaalku waxay muuqataa boqolkiiba 7 boqolkiiba ee F1 oo kala duduwan tusaalaha ugu wanaagsan iyo tababarka dadka, qaababka joogtana way ka fog yihiin inay ka xalliyaan dhibaatadan.', 'ur': 'This paper proposes a new task regarding event reason extraction from document-level texts. پہلے کی دلیل شناسایی کوشش کے مطابق، ہم متن میں موقع ایٹیونٹوں کو نہیں دیتے، لیکن صرف ساختار ایٹیونٹ کی توصیف دیتے ہیں، اور ایسی سیٹیونٹوں کو اضافہ کرنے کے مطابق زیادہ موقع دیتے ہیں. اور ہم نے ایک بڑی ڈیٹ سٹ فینٹ کیسون کو ارزیابی کے لئے اظہار کیا ہے، جو کمپنی اظہارات میں فینٹ سٹ کے لئے رائیسون کا اظہار دیتا ہے۔ یہ کام مشکل ہے کیونکہ بہت سی حادثوں، بہت سی دلیلوں اور غلطی دلیلوں میں شامل ہوئے ہیں. فینر ریسون میں 8.794 ڈکومکینٹ، 12.861 مالی حادثہ اور 11.006 دلیل حادثہ ہے. ہم نے بھی اس کام کے بارے میں حادثہ اٹھانے اور ماشین پڑھنے کے مطابق موجود کانونیک طریقوں کی عملکرد بھی حاصل کرتے ہیں. نتیجے 7 فیصد پوینٹ F1 اسکور کے درمیان بہترین موڈل اور انسان کے عمل کے درمیان فاصلہ دکھاتے ہیں، اور موجود طریقے اس مسئلہ کو حل کرنے سے دور ہیں.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் ஆவண- நிலை உரைகளிலிருந்து வெளியேற்றும் காரணத்தின் புதிய பணியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறது. @ info மேலும், நாம் ஒரு பெரிய தரவுத்தளத்தை அறிவிப்பதற்கான காரணம், அது நிறுவனத்தின் அறிவிப்பில் நிதிய நிகழ்வுகளுக்கான காரணம்  This task is challenging because the cases of multiple-events, multiple-reasons, and implicit-reasons are included.  மொத்தத்தில், காரணம் 8,794 ஆவணங்கள், 12,861 நிகழ்வுகள் மற்றும் 11,006 காரணத்தின் இடைவெளிகள் உள்ளது. இந்த பணியில் உள்ள கானோனிக் முறைகளின் செயல்பாடு முடிவுகள் சிறந்த மாதிரி மற்றும் மனித செயல்பாட்டிற்கும் இடையே ஒரு 7 விழுக்காட்டு புள்ளியை காட்டுகிறது, இருக்கும் மு', 'uz': "@ info Oldingi sabablarni aniqlash vazifasiga o'xshash, biz matnni qanday qilmaymiz, balki faqat structural hodisa taʼriflarini koʻrsatish mumkin, va bu moslamalar taʼminlovchilarga qo'shiladi. Ko'rib, biz qiymatlar uchun katta maʼlumotlar tarkibini tahrirlash sababi, bu kompaniyalar davomida Financial Events haqida taʼminlovchi sabablar beradi. Bu vazifa murakkab qiladi, chunki bir necha hodisa, ko'plab sabablar va umuman sabablar qo'llangan. Bunday sabab, 8,794 hujjatlar, 12,861 financial events and 11,006 sababni saqlaydi. Biz shu vazifani chiqarish va mashinani o'qish muvaffaqiyatlarida mavjud kanonik usullarni bajarishimizni anglatamiz. Natijalar eng yaxshi model va inson amalning orasidagi 7 foiz qiymat F1 qiymati gap koʻrsatiladi. Mavjud usullar bu muammolarni toʻxtatishdan uzoq.", 'vi': 'Bài báo đề nghị một nhiệm vụ mới về việc trích xuất lý do sự kiện trong văn bản. Không giống như nhiệm vụ nhận dạng nhân quả trước, chúng tôi không phân phối các sự kiện tiêu biểu trong văn bản, mà chỉ cung cấp mô tả các sự kiện cấu trúc, và các thiết lập này hợp với các trường hợp hành động. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi ghi chú một tập tin lớn Lý luận để đánh giá, nó cung cấp điều khoản cho các sự kiện tài chính trong thông báo công ty. Nhiệm vụ này rất khó khăn bởi vì các trường hợp đa sự kiện, đa lý, và các lý do ngầm được ghi lại. Cuối cùng, FinLí có chứa tài liệu 8,794, 12,861 các sự kiện tài chính và lý do 11,006. Chúng tôi cung cấp khả năng thực hiện các phương pháp tiêu chuẩn đã có trong trường hợp khai thác và hiểu rõ các máy về nhiệm vụ này. Kết quả cho thấy khoảng cách 7 phần trăm F1 giữa mô hình tốt nhất và khả năng con người, và các phương pháp đã có còn cách rất xa để giải quyết vấn đề này.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predlaže novi zadatak u vezi izvlačenja razloga događaja iz teksta na razini dokumenta. Za razliku od prethodnog zadatka otkrivanja uzrokovanja uzrokovanja, mi ne dajemo ciljne događaje u tekstu, već samo obezbjeđujemo strukturne opise događaja, te takve postavke se više slažu s scenarijama prakse. Osim toga, označavamo veliku skupinu podataka FinReason za procjenu, koja pruža oznake za razloge financijskih događaja u objavama društva. Ovaj zadatak je izazovan jer su uključeni slučajevi višestrukih događaja, višestrukih razloga i implicitnih razloga. Ukupno, FinReason sadrži 8.794 dokumenta, 12.861 financijskih događaja i 11.006 razloga. Također pružamo učinkovitost postojećih kanoničkih metoda u slučaju izvlačenja i razumijevanja strojeva o ovom zadatku. Rezultati pokazuju prazninu 7 procentnih točki F1 rezultata između najboljeg model a i ljudskog učinka, a postojećih metoda su daleko od rješavanja ovog problema.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия предлага нова задача по извличане на причина от текстове на ниво документ. За разлика от предишната задача за откриване на причинно-следствена връзка, ние не задаваме целеви събития в текста, а предоставяме само описания на структурни събития и такива настройки съответстват повече на практическите сценарии. Освен това анотираме голям набор от данни за оценка, който предоставя анотация на причини за финансови събития в фирмените съобщения. Тази задача е предизвикателна, защото са включени случаи на множество събития, множество причини и имплицитни причини. Общо съдържа 8 794 документа, 12 861 финансови събития и 11 006 причини. Ние също така осигуряваме изпълнението на съществуващите канонични методи за извличане на събития и машинно четене разбиране на тази задача. Резултатите показват 7 процентни пункта разлика между най-добрия модел и човешкото представяне, а съществуващите методи далеч не решават този проблем.', 'da': 'Denne artikel foreslår en ny opgave vedrørende hændelsesårsudtrækning fra tekster på dokumentniveau. I modsætning til den tidligere opgave vedrørende registrering af årsagssammenhæng tildeler vi ikke målbegivenheder i teksten, men leverer kun strukturelle hændelsesbeskrivelser, og sådanne indstillinger stemmer mere overens med praksisscenarier. Desuden noterer vi et stort datasæt FinReason til evaluering, som giver årsager annotation til finansielle begivenheder i virksomhedens meddelelser. Denne opgave er udfordrende, fordi tilfælde af flere begivenheder, flere årsager og implicitte årsager er inkluderet. I alt indeholder FinReason 8.794 dokumenter, 12.861 finansielle begivenheder og 11.006 årsager spænder. Vi leverer også udførelsen af eksisterende kanoniske metoder i eventudtrækning og maskinlæseforståelse på denne opgave. Resultaterne viser en 7 procentpoint F1 score gap mellem den bedste model og menneskelige ydeevne, og eksisterende metoder er langt fra at løse dette problem.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mengusulkan tugas baru mengenai ekstraksi alasan peristiwa dari teks tingkat dokumen. Tidak seperti tugas deteksi penyebab sebelumnya, kita tidak mengatur peristiwa sasaran dalam teks, tetapi hanya menyediakan deskripsi peristiwa struktural, dan pengaturan tersebut lebih cocok dengan skenario praktek. Selain itu, kami menyatakan dataset besar FinReason untuk evaluasi, yang menyediakan Reasons annotasi untuk peristiwa keuangan dalam pengumuman perusahaan. Tugas ini menantang karena kasus multi-event, multiple-reasons, dan implicit-reasons termasuk. Total, FinReason mengandung 8.794 dokumen, 12.861 peristiwa keuangan dan 11.006 alasan. Kami juga menyediakan prestasi dari metode canonik yang ada dalam ekstraksi peristiwa dan pemahaman pembacaan mesin pada tugas ini. Hasilnya menunjukkan jarak skor F1 7 poin antara model terbaik dan prestasi manusia, dan metode yang ada jauh dari memecahkan masalah ini.', 'ko': '본고는 문서급 텍스트에서 사건의 원인을 추출하는 새로운 임무를 제시했다.이전의 인과관계 검출 임무와 달리 우리는 텍스트에서 목표 이벤트를 지정하지 않고 구조화된 이벤트 설명만 제공하기 때문에 이런 설정은 실천 장면에 더욱 부합된다.그 밖에 우리는 대형 데이터 집합인 FinReason for evaluation을 주석했는데, 이것은 회사의 공고 중의 재무 사건에 원인 주석을 제공했다.이 임무는 여러 사건, 여러 원인, 은밀한 원인을 포함하기 때문에 도전적이다.FinReason은 총 8794개의 문서, 12861개의 재무 사건, 11006개의 원인 경계를 포함한다.우리는 또한 기존의 규범적인 방법이 사건 추출과 기계 읽기와 이해 방면의 성능을 제공했다.그 결과 최적 모델과 인적 실적 간의 F1 점수 차이는 7퍼센트로 기존 방법으로는 이 문제를 해결할 수 없었다.', 'nl': "Dit document stelt een nieuwe taak voor met betrekking tot de extractie van gebeurtenisreden uit teksten op documentniveau. In tegenstelling tot de vorige causaliteitsdetectietaak wijzen we geen doelgebeurtenissen toe in de tekst, maar geven we alleen structurele gebeurtenisbeschrijvingen, en dergelijke instellingen stemmen meer overeen met praktijkscenario's. Bovendien annoteren we een grote dataset FinReason voor evaluatie, die Reasons annotation voor financiële gebeurtenissen in bedrijfsaankondigingen biedt. Deze taak is uitdagend omdat de gevallen van meervoudige gebeurtenissen, meervoudige redenen en impliciete redenen zijn opgenomen. In totaal bevat FinReason 8,794 documenten, 12,861 financiële gebeurtenissen en 11,006 rede spans. We bieden ook de uitvoering van bestaande canonieke methoden in gebeurtenisextractie en machine reading begrip op deze taak. De resultaten tonen een 7-procentpunt F1 score kloof tussen het beste model en menselijke prestaties, en bestaande methoden zijn verre van het oplossen van dit probleem.", 'de': 'Diese Arbeit schlägt eine neue Aufgabe zur Extraktion von Ereignisursachen aus Texten auf Dokumentenebene vor. Im Gegensatz zur vorherigen Aufgabe zur Kausalitätserkennung weisen wir im Text keine Zielereignisse zu, sondern stellen nur strukturelle Ereignisbeschreibungen bereit, und solche Einstellungen stimmen eher mit Praxisszenarien überein. Darüber hinaus kommentieren wir einen großen Datensatz FinReason zur Auswertung, der Reasons Annotation für Finanzereignisse in Unternehmensankündigungen bereitstellt. Diese Aufgabe ist herausfordernd, da die Fälle von multiplen Ereignissen, multiplen Gründen und impliziten Gründen einbezogen werden. Insgesamt enthält FinReason 8,794 Dokumente, 12,861 finanzielle Ereignisse und 11,006 Grund Spanns. Wir bieten auch die Durchführung bestehender kanonischer Methoden der Ereignisextraktion und des maschinellen Leseverständnisses an. Die Ergebnisse zeigen eine 7-prozentuale F1-Punktlücke zwischen dem besten Modell und der menschlichen Leistung, und bestehende Methoden sind weit davon entfernt, dieses Problem zu lösen.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک کار جدید درباره\u200cی اخراج دلیل رویداد از متن\u200cهای سطح سند پیشنهاد می\u200cکند. برخلاف کار شناسایی دلایل قبلی، ما رویدادهای هدف را در متن مقرر نمی کنیم، بلکه فقط توضیح رویدادهای ساختاری را پیشنهاد می کنیم، و این تنظیمات بیشتر با سناریو تمرین مشترک می شوند. به علاوه، ما یک مجموعه اطلاعات بزرگ FinReason را برای ارزیابی مشخص می\u200cکنیم، که به دلیل اعلام دادن رویداد\u200cهای مالی در اظهار شرکتها نشان می\u200cدهد. این وظیفه سخت\u200cگیری است چون پرونده\u200cهای چندین رویداد، دلایل\u200cهای متعدد و دلایل\u200cهای معمولی شامل می\u200cشوند. در جمله، فینریسون شامل 8.794 سند، 12.861 اتفاقات مالی و 11.006 دلیل فاصله است. ما همچنین عملکرد روش\u200cهای کانونیک موجود در اتفاق اخراج و خواندن ماشین درک این کار را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که فاصله\u200cهای نقطه\u200cی 7 درصد F1 بین بهترین مدل و عملکرد انسان است، و روش\u200cهای موجود از حل این مشکل دور است.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linapendekeza juhudi mpya kuhusu sababu ya utekelezaji wa matukio kutoka kwenye maandishi ya kiwango cha nyaraka. Tofauti na jukumu la kutambua sababu zilizopita, hatuweki matukio yanayolenga kwenye maandishi, lakini tu hutoa maelezo ya tukio la ujenzi, na mazingira haya yanajumuisha zaidi na hali ya mazoea. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaelezea kituo kikubwa cha taarifa cha Finsababu cha uchunguzi, ambacho kinatoa taarifa za matukio ya kifedha katika matangazo ya kampuni. Kazi hii inachangamoto kwa sababu matukio mengi, sababu nyingi na sababu zisizo na maana yanajumuisha. In total, FinReason contains 8,794 documents, 12,861 financial events and 11,006 reason spans.  Pia tunatoa ufanisi wa mbinu zilizopo katika tukio la utekelezaji na kusoma mashine katika kazi hii. Matokeo yanaonyesha kiwango cha asilimia 7 cha F1 cha kupungua tofauti kati ya mifano bora na utendaji wa binadamu, na njia zilizopo ni mbali na kutatua tatizo hili.', 'af': "Hierdie papier voorstel 'n nuwe taak aangaande gebeurtenis rede uitpakking van dokument- vlak teks. Ongelyks van die vorige oorsaaklikheid-beskrywing taak, ons doen nie die doel-gebeurtenis in die teks toewys nie, maar net strukturele gebeurtenis beskrywings verskaf, en sodanige instellings meer ooreenkomstig met praktiese scenarios. Ook, ons annoteer 'n groot datastel FinReason vir evaluering, wat verskaf Reasons annotasie vir Finansiewe gebeurtenis in maatskappy aankennings. Hierdie taak is uitgelyk omdat die gevalle van veelvuldige-gebeurtenis, veelvuldige-redes en inplisite-redes ingesluit word. In totaal, FinReason bevat 8,794 dokumente, 12,861 finansiële gebeurtenis en 11,006 rede spans. Ons verskaf ook die prestasie van bestaande kanoniese metodes in gebeurtenis uittrek en masjien lees verstanding op hierdie taak. Die resultate vertoon 'n 7 persentasie punt F1 telling spans tussen die beste model en menslike prestasie, en bestaande metodes is ver van die oplossing van hierdie probleem.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument propozon një detyrë të re lidhur me nxjerrjen e arsyeve të ngjarjes nga tekstet në nivel të dokumentit. Në ndryshim nga detyra e mëparshme e zbulimit të shkakut, ne nuk caktojmë ngjarje objektive në tekst, por vetëm ofrojmë përshkrime strukturore të ngjarjeve, dhe rregullime të tilla përshtaten më shumë me skenarët e praktikës. Përveç kësaj, ne anotojmë një grup të madh të dhënash FinReason për vlerësim, i cili ofron arsye anotacion për ngjarjet financiare në njoftimet e kompanisë. Kjo detyrë është sfiduese sepse janë përfshirë rastet e ngjarjeve të shumta, arsyeve të shumta dhe arsyeve implicite. Në total, FinReason përmban 8,794 dokumente, 12,861 ngjarje financiare dhe 11,006 zgjatje arsyesh. Ne gjithashtu ofrojmë shfaqjen e metodave kanonike ekzistuese në ekstrahimin e ngjarjeve dhe kuptimin e leximit të makinave në këtë detyrë. Rezultatet tregojnë një dallim në pikën 7 përqind F1 midis modelit më të mirë dhe performancës njerëzore dhe metodat ekzistuese janë larg zgjidhjes së këtij problemi.', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը առաջարկում է նոր խնդիր իրադարձությունների պատճառի հանելու մասին փաստաթղթի մակարդակի տեքստերից: Ի տարբերություն նախորդ պատճառականության հայտնաբերման խնդիրներին, մենք չենք սահմանում նպատակային իրադարձությունները տեքստում, այլ միայն տրամադրում ենք կառուցվածքային իրադարձությունների նկարագրություններ, և նման սահմանումները ավելի շատ համապատասխանում են գործ Ավելին, մենք նկարագրում ենք մի մեծ տվյալների համակարգ FinReason գնահատման համար, որը ֆինանսական իրադարձությունների մասին պատճառներ է տրամադրում ընկերության հայտարարություններում: Այս խնդիրը դժվար է, որովհետև բազմաթիվ իրադարձությունների, բազմաթիվ պատճառների և ենթադրական պատճառների դեպքերը ներառված են: Ընդհանուր առմամբ, FinReason-ը ներառում է 8,794 փաստաթղթեր, 12,851 ֆինանսական իրադարձություններ և 11,006 պատճառի ընթացքում: Մենք նաև ներկայացնում ենք գոյություն ունեցող կանոնական մեթոդների արտադրողականությունը իրադարձությունների վերացման և մեքենային կարդալու ընկալում այս խնդրի մասին: The results show a 7 percentage point F1 score gap between the best model and human performance, and existing methods are far from resolving this problem.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz täze bir zady rugsat sebäbi sened-seviňden çykarmak üçin teklip edip teklip edýär. Öňki sebäpli tanyş täblisasynyň ýaly, biz metin içinde maksady vaýtalary takyklamaýarys, ýöne diňe strukturly waýtalary tassymlary berip bileris beýleki düzümler praktik senaryoň bilen ylalaşýar. Munuň üçin, biz uly dataset FinReason'a deňlenmek üçin duýgulandyrýarys. Şol sebäpleri şirket duýgulamalarynda Maliýe geçirmeleri üçin duýgulandyrýar. Bu zady gaty kynçylyksyz sebäbi birnäçe hadysalar, birnäçe sebäpleri we netijesi sebäpleri dahil edildi. Toplam bolsa, FinReason 8,794 sened, 12,861 maliýe hadysalary we 11,006 sebäpli uzaklaşdyrylýar Biz hem şu zady açmak we maşynyň okamak düşünmesinde bolan kanonik yönleriň etkinleşigini bererdik. netijeler F1 sany iň gowy nusga we adam netijesi arasynda 7 prosent nokatynyň gapysyny görkezýär we bu meseleni çözmekden uzak dur.", 'az': 'Bu kağıt belə vaxt səbəbi mətnindən çıxarılması haqqında yeni bir iş təklif edir. Əvvəlki causaliyyət keşfetməsi işindən başqa, mətndə məqsəd vaqiaları təyin etmirik, lakin yalnız strukturlu vaxt tərzlərini təyin edirik, və bu tərzlərin daha çox təcrübə scenariyalarına uyğunlaşdırır. Daha sonra, şirkətin xəbərlərində FinReason üçün böyük bir verilən qurğunu danışırıq. Bu işlər çoxlu olaraq, çoxlu səbəblər və implicit-səbəblərinin davranışlarına görə çətin olandır. Toplam FinReason 8.794 belədi, 12.861 malik olaraq və 11.006 səbəb uzaqlaşması barəsindədir. Biz həmçin in bu işin anlaşılması və maşına oxumaq üçün mevcut kanonik metodların performansını təmin edirik. Sonuçlar ən yaxşı modeli və insan performansı arasında 7 procent noktası F1 nöqtəsi boşluğunu göstərir, və həmin metodlar bu problemi çəkməkdən uzaqlaşdırır.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predlaže novi zadatak u vezi izvlačenja razloga događaja iz teksta na nivou dokumenta. Za razliku od prethodnog zadatka otkrivanja uzrokovanja uzrokovanja, mi ne dajemo ciljne događaje u tekstu, već samo obezbeđujemo opise strukturnih događaja, a takve postavke se više slažu s scenarijama prakse. Osim toga, annotiramo veliku skupu podataka FinReason za procjenu, koja pruža annotaciju Reasons za financijske događaje u objavama kompanije. Ovaj zadatak je izazovan jer su uključeni slučajevi višestrukih događaja, višestrukih razloga i implicitnih razloga. Ukupno, FinReason sadrži 8.794 dokumenta, 12.861 financijskih događaja i 11.006 razloga. Također pružamo učinkovitost postojećih kanoničkih metoda u slučaju izvlačenja i razumijevanja mašine o ovom zadatku. Rezultati pokazuju prazninu 7 procentnih točki F1 rezultata između najboljeg model a i ljudskog učinka, a postojećih metoda su daleko od rješavanja ovog problema.', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም የሰነድ ደረጃ ጽሑፎችን ለመውሰድ አዲስ ስራ ያሳያል፡፡ የቀድሞው ምክንያት ማሳየት ስራ በተለየ፣ የጉዳዩ ጉዳዮች በጽሑፉ ውስጥ አንሰራም፥ ነገር ግን የመሠረተ ጉዳይ ግንኙነቶችን ብቻ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም የዳታ ሰርቨሮች ጉዳይ ለማድረግ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ይህ ስራ የብዙ ሁኔታዎች፣ ብዙ ምክንያቶች እና ጥሩ ምክንያቶች ተጨማሪ ነው፡፡ በሙሉ ምክንያት 8,794 ሰነዶች፣ 12,861 የሀብት ጉዳዮች እና 11,006 ምክንያት ጥቀት ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ ላይ የካኖኒካዊ ሥርዓት እና መሳሪያዎችን አነብብ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፍጥረቱም የበለጠ ሞዴል እና የሰው አካባቢ መካከል የ7 በመቶ ነጥብ F1 ነጥብ ክፍል የሚያሳየው ነው፣ የአሁኑንም ሥርዓት የዚህን ጉዳይ ከመመለስ ራቅ ነው፡፡', 'ca': "Aquest paper proposa una nova tasca en relació a l'extracció de motius d'eventos dels textos a nivell documental. A diferència de la tasca anterior de detecció de causalitat, no asignem esdeveniments alvos al text, sinó només proporcionem descripcions estructurals d'esdeveniments, i aquestes opcions s'ajusten més a escenaris de pràctica. A més, anotem un gran conjunt de dades FinReason per a l'evaluació, que proporciona Reasons anotació per eventos financers en anuncis d'empresa. This task is challenging because the cases of multiple-events, multiple-reasons, and implicit-reasons are included.  En total, FinReason conté 8.794 documents, 12.861 esdeveniments financers i 11.006 espais de raons. També proporcionem el rendiment dels mètodes canònics existents en l'extracció de casos i la comprensió de la lectura màquina sobre aquesta tasca. The results show a 7 percentage point F1 score gap between the best model and human performance, and existing methods are far from resolving this problem.", 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis pakutakse välja uus ülesanne seoses sündmuse põhjuse ekstraheerimisega dokumenditasemel tekstidest. Erinevalt eelmisest põhjusliku seose tuvastamise ülesandest ei määra me tekstis sihtsündmusi, vaid pakume ainult struktuurseid sündmuste kirjeldusi ja need sätted vastavad rohkem praktikastsenaariumidele. Lisaks märgistame suure andmekogumi FinReason hindamiseks, mis pakub ettevõtte teadaannetes Finantsürituste põhjused. See ülesanne on keeruline, sest kaasatud on mitme sündmuse, mitme põhjusega ja kaudse põhjusega juhtumid. Kokku sisaldab FinReason 8 794 dokumenti, 12 861 finantssündmust ja 11 006 põhjuse ulatust. Samuti pakume olemasolevate kanooniliste meetodite täitmist sündmuste ekstraheerimisel ja masinlugemisel selle ülesande kohta. Tulemused näitavad 7 protsendipunkti F1 skoori lõhet parima mudeli ja inimese jõudluse vahel ning olemasolevad meetodid ei lahenda seda probleemi kaugeltki.', 'cs': 'Tento článek navrhuje nový úkol týkající se extrakce důvodů událostí z textů na úrovni dokumentů. Na rozdíl od předchozího úkolu detekce kauzality nepřiřazujeme cílové události v textu, nýbrž poskytujeme pouze strukturální popisy událostí a tato nastavení více odpovídají praktickým scénářům. Kromě toho anotujeme rozsáhlý datový soubor FinReason pro hodnocení, který poskytuje anotaci důvodů pro finanční události v oznámeních společnosti. Tento úkol je náročný, protože jsou zahrnuty případy více událostí, více důvodů a implicitních důvodů. Celkem FinReason obsahuje 8,794 dokumenty, 12,861 finanční události a 11,006 rozpětí důvodů. Zajišťujeme také výkon stávajících kanonických metod v extrakci událostí a porozumění strojovému čtení na tomto úkolu. Výsledky ukazují sedm procentních bodů F1 skóre mezi nejlepším modelem a lidským výkonem a stávající metody tento problém zdaleka nevyřeší.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি নথি স্তরের টেক্সট থেকে অনুষ্ঠানের কারণ বের করার জন্য একটি নতুন কাজ প্রস্তাব করেছে। পূর্ববর্তী কারণের সনাক্তির কাজের বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন, আমরা টেক্সটে লক্ষ্য করি না, কিন্তু শুধুমাত্র কাঠামোর ইভেন এছাড়াও আমরা একটি বিশাল ডাটাসেট মূল্যের কারণে ঘোষণা দিয়েছি, যা কোম্পানির ঘোষণায় অর্থনৈতিক ঘটনার কারণে ঘোষণা দিয়েছে। এই কাজ চ্যালেঞ্জ করছে কারণ বেশ কিছু অনুষ্ঠান, বেশ কারণ এবং কারণের মধ্যে রয়েছে। সম্পূর্ণ কারণে ৮,৭৯৪ নথি, ১২,৮৬১ অর্থনৈতিক অনুষ্ঠান এবং ১১,০০৬ কারণ স্পেন। এছাড়াও আমরা বিদ্যমান ক্যানোনিক পদ্ধতির প্রভাব প্রদান করি এই কাজে বের করে আনা এবং মেশিন পাঠ করার সময়। ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে সেরা মডেল এবং মানুষের প্রদর্শনের মধ্যে ৭ শতাংশ বিন্দু এফ১ স্কোরের মধ্যে বিভ্রান্ত, আর বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä ehdotetaan uutta tehtävää tapahtumasyiden poimimiseksi dokumenttitason teksteistä. Toisin kuin edellisessä syy-yhteyden tunnistustehtävässä, emme määritä kohdetapahtumia tekstissä, vaan tarjoamme vain rakenteellisia tapahtumakuvauksia, ja tällaiset asetukset sopivat paremmin käytäntöskenaarioihin. Lisäksi lisäämme arviointiin suuren FinReason-aineiston, joka tarjoaa Reasons-merkinnän taloustapahtumiin yritysilmoituksissa. Tämä tehtävä on haastava, koska mukana on useita tapahtumia, useita syitä ja implisiittisiä syitä. FinReason sisältää yhteensä 8 794 asiakirjaa, 12 861 rahoitustapahtumaa ja 11 006 syytä. Tarjoamme myös olemassa olevien kanonisten menetelmien suorituskykyä tapahtumanpoistossa ja konelukemisen ymmärtämisessä tässä tehtävässä. Tulokset osoittavat, että parhaan mallin ja ihmisen suorituskyvyn välinen F1-pisteero on 7 prosenttiyksikköä, ja olemassa olevat menetelmät eivät ole vielä ratkaisseet tätä ongelmaa.', 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop Andong kabeh wektu kelas telu butunggal sing saben, kita ora iso nggawe Tarjamahan kanggo teks, pero iso nggawe baho structural eventah akeh nggawe layar, lan iso nggawe sistem sing beranduh operasi layar karo scenaro praksi. Label task-type TOC Awak dhéwé éntuk akeh perbudhakan kanggo kelas perangkat karo akeh dumadhi kanggo ngerasakno karo perangkat kuwi. Pametuné sembarang 7% sing paling F1 kuwi nggawe gerakan ning model sing luwih dumadhi karo nganggep wong liyane, lan supoyo sing kana mburu perusahaan karo perusahaan iki.', 'ha': "Wannan takardar da ke buƙata wani aikin da ke husu zartar da shiryarwa daga takardar-daraja. Di motsi da aikin kwanan da ya gabata, ba mu raba abun alama cikin matsayin, kuma amma za mu motsa kwamfyutan ayukan ayuka na tukio na rubutu, kuma masu daidaita su sami da surori masu yin amfani da. Kayya, Munã sanar da takardar data masu girma Wannan aikin yana tsõratar da shi, kwanan nan da aka include masu sakan masu yawa, masu saba da tarawa. Gansa da takardar Finni na ƙunsa da 8,794 takardar, 12,861 abũbuwan kifisci da saban 11,06 za'a spana. Kayya, Munã samar da mafarin hanyoyin kanoniki idan an nuna ko karatun karatun karatun na kafin da ake karanta fassarar wannan aikin. The results show a 7 percentage point F1 score gap between the best model and human performance, and existing methods are far from resolving this problem.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek predlaga novo nalogo glede ekstrakcije razlogov dogodkov iz besedil na ravni dokumenta. Za razliko od prejšnjega opravila zaznavanja vzročnosti v besedilu ne dodeljujemo ciljnih dogodkov, temveč zagotavljamo le opise strukturnih dogodkov, takšne nastavitve pa so bolj usklajene s scenariji prakse. Poleg tega za vrednotenje navajamo velik nabor podatkov FinReason, ki v objavah podjetja zagotavlja opombo Razlogi za finančne dogodke. Ta naloga je zahtevna, ker so vključeni primeri več dogodkov, več razlogov in implicitnih razlogov. FinReason vsebuje 8.794 dokumentov, 12.861 finančnih dogodkov in 11.006 razlogov. Zagotavljamo tudi izvedbo obstoječih kanoničnih metod pri ekstrakciji dogodkov in strojnem branju pri tej nalogi. Rezultati kažejo 7 odstotnih točk F1 rezultatov med najboljšim modelom in človeško zmogljivostjo, obstoječe metode pa še zdaleč niso rešile tega problema.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་ཕྱིར་འདོན་ནས་བྱ་འགུལ་གསར་པ་ཞིག་བསམ་བྱེད། Unlike the previous causality detection task, we do not assign target events in the text, but only provide structural event descriptions, and such settings accord more with practice scenarios. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། བྱ་འགུལ་འདི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཆེན་པོ་ཡོད་ལ། གང་ལགས་ཞེ་ན། བྱ་འགུལ་འདི་གི་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ ཡོངས་བསྡུས་ཀྱི་FinReason དེ་ཡིག་ཚང་། 8,794 ཡིག་ཆ་དང་། 12,861 རྒྱུ་ནོར་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་། 11,006 རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག གྲུབ་འབྲས་ཀྱིས་མིག་སྔར་སྒྲིག་ཚད་གཅིག་པ་དང་མིག་སྐྱེས་པའི་མཐུན་ཚད་ལྡན་མཚམས་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན།', 'he': 'This paper proposes a new task regarding event reason extraction from document-level texts.  בניגוד למשימת גילוי הסיבות הקודמת, אנחנו לא מציינים אירועים מטרה בטקסט, אלא רק מספקים תיאור אירועים מבנייים, והסדרות האלה מתאימות יותר לתרחישות מעשיות. חוץ מזה, אנו מציינים קבוצת נתונים גדולה FinReason להערכה, אשר מספק סיבות ציון לאירועים פיננסיים בהודעות חברה. המשימה הזאת מאתגרת בגלל שהמקרים של אירועים רבים, סיבות רבות, וסיבות מילויות כוללים. In total, FinReason contains 8,794 documents, 12,861 financial events and 11,006 reason spans.  אנחנו גם מספקים את ההופעה של שיטות קנוניות קיימות באירועים חולץ וקריאה מכונות הבנה על המשימה הזאת. התוצאות מראות פער נקודה אחוזית בתוצאות F1 בין המודל הטוב ביותר לביצוע האנושי, ושיטות קיימות רחוקות מלפתור את הבעיה הזאת.'}
{'en': 'Language Modelling as a Multi-Task Problem', 'ar': 'نمذجة اللغة كمشكلة متعددة المهام', 'es': 'El modelado del lenguaje como un problema multitarea', 'fr': 'La modélisation linguistique en tant que problème multitâche', 'pt': 'Modelagem de linguagem como um problema multitarefa', 'ja': 'マルチタスク問題としての言語モデリング', 'ru': 'Языковое моделирование как многозадачная проблема', 'hi': 'एक बहु-कार्य समस्या के रूप में भाषा मॉडलिंग', 'zh': '语建模为多任务', 'ga': 'Samhaltú Teanga mar Fhadhb Ilthasc', 'ka': 'ენის მოდელირება როგორც მრავალ- დავალების პრობლემა', 'hu': 'Nyelvmodellezés mint többfeladatos probléma', 'it': 'Modellazione linguistica come problema multi-task', 'el': 'Η μοντελοποίηση γλωσσών ως πρόβλημα πολλαπλών εργασιών', 'mk': 'Моделирање јазик како проблем со повеќе задачи', 'lt': 'Kalbos modeliavimas kaip kelių užduočių problema', 'ms': 'Language Modelling as a Multi-Task Problem', 'mn': 'Холын загвар олон-үйл ажиллагааны асуудал гэх мэт', 'kk': 'Тіл үлгісін көп- тапсырма мәселесі ретінде', 'no': 'Språk- modellering som eit problem med fleire oppgåver', 'ml': 'Multi- Task പ്രശ്നമായി ഭാഷ മോഡോളിലേക്കു്', 'mt': 'Language Modelling as a Multi-Task Problem', 'si': 'භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ', 'so': 'Luqada Modeling as a dhibaato badan oo shaqo', 'pl': 'Modelowanie języka jako problem wielozadaniowy', 'ta': 'Multi- பணி பிரச்சனையாக மொழி மாற்றுதல்', 'ro': 'Modelarea limbii ca problemă cu mai multe sarcini', 'ur': 'Multi-Task مشکل کے طور پر زبان مدل لینگ', 'sr': 'Modeliranje jezika kao multi-Task problem', 'sv': 'Språkmodellering som ett problem med flera uppgifter', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chế độ ngôn ngữ như một vấn đề đa tác vụ', 'hr': 'Modeliranje jezika kao multi-task problem', 'da': 'Sprogmodellering som et problem med flere opgaver', 'bg': 'Езиково моделиране като проблем с няколко задачи', 'nl': 'Taalmodellering als een probleem met meerdere taken', 'ko': '다중 임무 문제의 언어 모델로 삼다', 'de': 'Sprachmodellierung als Mehraufgabenproblem', 'id': 'Modeling Bahasa sebagai Masalah Multi-Tugas', 'tr': 'Dil nusgala', 'sw': 'Tatizo la lugha linaloandikwa kama tatizo la kazi nyingi', 'af': "Taal Modelering as 'n Multi- Task Problem", 'sq': 'Modelimi i gjuhës si një problem me shumë detyra', 'fa': 'مدل زبانی به عنوان مشکل چندین کار', 'hy': 'Լեզու մոդելը որպես բազմախնդիր', 'az': 'Multi-Task problemi olaraq dil modellÉ™ri', 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'bn': 'অনেক কাজের সমস্যা হিসেবে ভাষা মডেলিং', 'bs': 'Modeliranje jezika kao multitask problem', 'ca': 'Modell de llenguatge com un problema multitascat', 'cs': 'Jazykové modelování jako problém s více úlohami', 'et': 'Keele modelleerimine mitme ülesandega probleemina', 'fi': 'Kielimallinnus monitehtäväongelmana', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'he': 'מודל שפה כבעיה במשימות רבות', 'sk': 'Modeliranje jezikov kot težava z več opravili', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་མ་དབྱིབས་སྣ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཞིག་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we propose to study language modelling as a multi-task problem, bringing together three strands of research : multi-task learning, linguistics, and interpretability. Based on hypotheses derived from linguistic theory, we investigate whether language models adhere to learning principles of multi-task learning during training. To showcase the idea, we analyse the generalisation behaviour of language models as they learn the linguistic concept of Negative Polarity Items (NPIs). Our experiments demonstrate that a multi-task setting naturally emerges within the objective of the more general task of language modelling. We argue that this insight is valuable for multi-task learning, linguistics and interpretability research and can lead to exciting new findings in all three domains.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقترح دراسة نمذجة اللغة كمشكلة متعددة المهام ، تجمع بين ثلاثة فروع من البحث: التعلم متعدد المهام ، واللغويات ، وقابلية التفسير. استنادًا إلى الفرضيات المستمدة من النظرية اللغوية ، نتحرى ما إذا كانت نماذج اللغة تلتزم بمبادئ التعلم للتعلم متعدد المهام أثناء التدريب. لعرض الفكرة ، نقوم بتحليل سلوك التعميم لنماذج اللغة أثناء تعلمهم المفهوم اللغوي لعناصر القطبية السلبية (NPIs). توضح تجاربنا أن إعداد المهام المتعددة يظهر بشكل طبيعي ضمن هدف المهمة الأكثر عمومية المتمثلة في نمذجة اللغة. نجادل بأن هذه البصيرة ذات قيمة للتعلم متعدد المهام واللغويات وأبحاث التفسير ويمكن أن تؤدي إلى نتائج جديدة ومثيرة في جميع المجالات الثلاثة.', 'es': 'En este artículo, proponemos estudiar el modelado del lenguaje como un problema multitarea, reuniendo tres líneas de investigación: aprendizaje multitarea, lingüística e interpretabilidad. Sobre la base de hipótesis derivadas de la teoría lingüística, investigamos si los modelos lingüísticos se adhieren a los principios de aprendizaje del aprendizaje multitarea durante el entrenamiento. Para mostrar la idea, analizamos el comportamiento de generalización de los modelos lingüísticos a medida que aprenden el concepto lingüístico de los elementos de polaridad negativa (NPI). Nuestros experimentos demuestran que un entorno multitarea surge naturalmente dentro del objetivo de la tarea más general de modelar el lenguaje. Sostenemos que esta información es valiosa para el aprendizaje multitarea, la lingüística y la investigación de la interpretabilidad y puede conducir a nuevos y emocionantes hallazgos en los tres dominios.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous proposons d'étudier la modélisation linguistique en tant que problème multitâche, réunissant trois axes de recherche\xa0: l'apprentissage multitâche, la linguistique et l'interprétabilité. Sur la base d'hypothèses dérivées de la théorie linguistique, nous cherchons à savoir si les modèles linguistiques respectent les principes d'apprentissage de l'apprentissage multitâche pendant la formation. Pour présenter l'idée, nous analysons le comportement de généralisation des modèles linguistiques lorsqu'ils apprennent le concept linguistique des éléments de polarité négative (NPI). Nos expériences démontrent qu'un environnement multitâche apparaît naturellement dans l'objectif de la tâche plus générale de modélisation linguistique. Nous soutenons que ces connaissances sont précieuses pour l'apprentissage multitâche, la linguistique et la recherche sur l'interprétabilité et peuvent mener à de nouvelles découvertes passionnantes dans les trois domaines.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, propomos estudar a modelagem de linguagem como um problema multitarefa, reunindo três vertentes de pesquisa: aprendizagem multitarefa, linguística e interpretabilidade. Com base em hipóteses derivadas da teoria linguística, investigamos se os modelos de linguagem aderem aos princípios de aprendizagem da aprendizagem multitarefa durante o treinamento. Para mostrar a ideia, analisamos o comportamento de generalização dos modelos de linguagem à medida que aprendem o conceito linguístico de Itens de Polaridade Negativa (NPIs). Nossos experimentos demonstram que uma configuração multitarefa surge naturalmente dentro do objetivo da tarefa mais geral de modelagem de linguagem. Argumentamos que esse insight é valioso para aprendizado multitarefa, pesquisa linguística e interpretabilidade e pode levar a novas descobertas interessantes em todos os três domínios.', 'ja': 'この論文では、マルチタスクの問題として言語モデリングを研究し、マルチタスク学習、言語学、解釈可能性の3つの研究をまとめることを提案している。言語理論から導き出された仮説に基づいて、トレーニング中に言語モデルがマルチタスク学習の学習原理を遵守しているかどうかを調査します。このアイデアを紹介するために，言語モデルが否定的極性項目（ NPI ）の言語学的概念を学習する際の一般化行動を分析する．私たちの実験は、マルチタスク設定が言語モデリングのより一般的なタスクの目的内に自然に現れることを示しています。私たちは、この洞察はマルチタスク学習、言語学、および解釈可能性研究にとって価値があり、3つの領域すべてで刺激的な新しい発見につながる可能性があると主張しています。', 'zh': '于本文,建言建模为多任务,合三人于领地:多任务学,语言学可解释性。 盖取诸言语之理,究其言体,循多任务学之道。 为开此意,析言学负极性目(NPI)言念泛化行。 吾实验明多任务,自然见于言建模之尤者也。 臣愚以为此明于多任务学,语言学与可解释性论价直,而可于三领令人兴奋新见。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы предлагаем изучить языковое моделирование как многозадачную задачу, объединив три направления исследований: многозадачное обучение, лингвистика и интерпретируемость. Основываясь на гипотезах, выведенных из лингвистической теории, мы исследуем, придерживаются ли языковые модели принципов обучения многозадачного обучения во время обучения. Чтобы продемонстрировать эту идею, мы анализируем обобщающее поведение языковых моделей по мере того, как они изучают лингвистическую концепцию элементов отрицательной полярности (NPI). Наши эксперименты показывают, что многозадачность естественным образом возникает в рамках более общей задачи языкового моделирования. Мы утверждаем, что это понимание ценно для многозадачного обучения, лингвистики и исследований интерпретируемости и может привести к захватывающим новым результатам во всех трех областях.', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम एक बहु-कार्य समस्या के रूप में भाषा मॉडलिंग का अध्ययन करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो अनुसंधान के तीन किस्में एक साथ लाते हैं: बहु-कार्य सीखने, भाषाविज्ञान और व्याख्यायोग्यता। भाषाई सिद्धांत से प्राप्त परिकल्पनाओं के आधार पर, हम जांच करते हैं कि क्या भाषा मॉडल प्रशिक्षण के दौरान बहु-कार्य सीखने के सीखने के सिद्धांतों का पालन करते हैं। इस विचार को प्रदर्शित करने के लिए, हम भाषा मॉडल के सामान्यीकरण व्यवहार का विश्लेषण करते हैं क्योंकि वे नकारात्मक ध्रुवीयता आइटम (एनपीआई) की भाषाई अवधारणा सीखते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि भाषा मॉडलिंग के अधिक सामान्य कार्य के उद्देश्य के भीतर स्वाभाविक रूप से एक बहु-कार्य सेटिंग उभरती है। हम तर्क देते हैं कि यह अंतर्दृष्टि बहु-कार्य सीखने, भाषाविज्ञान और व्याख्यात्मकता अनुसंधान के लिए मूल्यवान है और सभी तीन डोमेन में रोमांचक नए निष्कर्षों को जन्म दे सकती है।', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, tá sé beartaithe againn staidéar a dhéanamh ar shamhaltú teanga mar fhadhb il-tasc, ag tabhairt trí shnáithe taighde le chéile: foghlaim ilthasc, teangeolaíocht, agus inléirmhíniú. Bunaithe ar hipitéisí a thagann ó theoiric theangeolaíoch, déanaimid iniúchadh ar cé acu an gcloíonn samhlacha teanga le prionsabail foghlama na foghlama ilthascanna le linn oiliúna. Chun an smaoineamh a léiriú, déanaimid anailís ar iompar ginearálaithe na múnlaí teanga agus iad ag foghlaim an choincheapa teangeolaíochta um Mhíreanna Polaíochta Diúltacha (NPIs). Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh go dtagann suíomh iltasc go nádúrtha chun cinn laistigh de chuspóir an taisc níos ginearálta de shamhaltú teanga. Áitímid go bhfuil an léargas seo luachmhar d’fhoghlaim il-thasc, don teangeolaíocht agus do thaighde inléirmhínithe agus go bhféadfadh sé teacht ar thorthaí nua spreagúla sna trí réimse go léir.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε να μελετήσουμε τη μοντελοποίηση γλωσσών ως πρόβλημα πολλαπλών εργασιών, συνδυάζοντας τρεις σκέλους έρευνας: εκμάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών, γλωσσολογία και ερμηνευσιμότητα. Με βάση υποθέσεις που προέρχονται από τη γλωσσική θεωρία, διερευνούμε αν τα γλωσσικά μοντέλα συμμορφώνονται με τις μαθησιακές αρχές της εκμάθησης πολλαπλών εργασιών κατά τη διάρκεια της εκπαίδευσης. Για να αναδείξουμε την ιδέα, αναλύουμε τη γενικευμένη συμπεριφορά των γλωσσικών μοντέλων καθώς μαθαίνουν τη γλωσσική έννοια των Αρνητικών Πολικών Αντικειμένων. Τα πειράματά μας αποδεικνύουν ότι ένα περιβάλλον πολλαπλών εργασιών αναδύεται φυσικά στο πλαίσιο του γενικότερου έργου της γλωσσικής μοντελοποίησης. Υποστηρίζουμε ότι αυτή η διορατικότητα είναι πολύτιμη για την εκμάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών, τη γλωσσολογία και την έρευνα ερμηνείας και μπορεί να οδηγήσει σε συναρπαστικά νέα ευρήματα και στους τρεις τομείς.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда тілдерді моделизацияны көп тапсырма мәселесі ретінде зерттеудің үш бөлігін біріктіруге ұсынамыз: көп тапсырма оқыту, лингвистик және интерпретациялық. Лингистикалық теориясынан шығарылған гипотезалардың негізінде, тіл үлгілерінің көп тапсырмаларды оқыту үшін бірнеше тапсырмаларды оқыту принципіне қатынасыз. Идеяны көрсету үшін, біз тіл үлгілерінің жалпы әрекеттерін анализирақ, олар негативті Польшалық нысандарының (НPI) лингвистикалық концепциясын үйренгенде. Біздің тәжірибеміздің көптеген тапсырмалар баптауы тілдерді модельген жалпы тапсырманың мақсатында болады дегенді көрсетеді. Бұл түсінікті бірнеше тапсырма оқыту, лингвистик және түсініктерді зерттеу үшін мәніміз бар деп айтып, үш доменде жаңа тапсырмалар табылады.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban azt javasoljuk, hogy a nyelvi modellezést többfeladatos problémaként tanulmányozzuk, amely három kutatási területet foglal össze: többfeladatos tanulás, nyelvészet és értelmezhetőség. A nyelvelméletből származó hipotézisek alapján vizsgáljuk, hogy a nyelvi modellek betartják-e a többfeladatú tanulás tanulási elveit a képzés során. Az ötlet bemutatásához elemezzük a nyelvi modellek általánosítási viselkedését, miközben megtanulják a negatív polaritási elemek (NPI) nyelvi fogalmát. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy a nyelvmodellezés általánosabb feladatainak célkitűzésében természetesen többfeladatos környezet jelenik meg. Azzal érvelünk, hogy ez a betekintés értékes a többfeladatos tanulás, a nyelvészet és az értelmezhetőség kutatásához, és mindhárom területen izgalmas új eredményekhez vezethet.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūlome išnagrinėti kalbų modeliavimą kaip daugiafunkcinę problem ą ir sujungti tris mokslinių tyrimų sritis: daugiafunkcinį mokymąsi, kalbos ir aiškinamumą. Based on hypotheses derived from linguistic theory, we investigate whether language models adhere to learning principles of multi-task learning during training.  Norėdami parodyti idėją, analizuojame kalbų modelių generalizacijos elgesį, kai jie mokosi kalbinės neigiamo poliariškumo elementų sąvokos. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad daugelio užduočių nustatymas natūraliai atsiranda siekiant bendresnio kalbų modeliavimo uždavinio. Mes teigiame, kad šis supratimas yra vertingas daugiašalių užduočių mokymosi, kalbos ir aiškinimo moksliniams tyrimams ir gali paskatinti įdomias naujas išvadas visose trijose srityse.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan untuk mempelajari model bahasa sebagai masalah berbilang-tugas, mengumpulkan tiga garis penyelidikan: pembelajaran berbilang-tugas, bahasa, dan keterlaluan. Berdasarkan hipotesis yang berasal dari teori bahasa, kami menyelidiki sama ada model bahasa mematuhi prinsip pembelajaran pembelajaran multi-tugas semasa latihan. Untuk menunjukkan idea ini, kita menganalisis perilaku generalisasi model bahasa semasa mereka belajar konsep bahasa Item Polariti Negatif (NPI). Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa tetapan tugas berbilang secara alami muncul dalam objektif tugas yang lebih umum untuk model bahasa. We argue that this insight is valuable for multi-task learning, linguistics and interpretability research and can lead to exciting new findings in all three domains.', 'it': "In questo articolo, proponiamo di studiare la modellazione linguistica come un problema multi-task, unendo tre filoni di ricerca: apprendimento multi-task, linguistica e interpretabilità. Sulla base di ipotesi derivate dalla teoria linguistica, esaminiamo se i modelli linguistici aderiscono ai principi di apprendimento dell'apprendimento multi-task durante la formazione. Per mostrare l'idea, analizziamo il comportamento di generalizzazione dei modelli linguistici mentre imparano il concetto linguistico di elementi di polarità negativa (NPI). I nostri esperimenti dimostrano che un ambiente multi-task emerge naturalmente all'interno dell'obiettivo del compito più generale della modellazione linguistica. Sosteniamo che questa intuizione è preziosa per l'apprendimento multi-task, la linguistica e la ricerca sull'interpretabilità e può portare a nuove scoperte interessanti in tutti e tre i settori.", 'mk': 'Во овој весник предлагаме да се проучува моделирање на јазикот како проблем со мултизадачи, спојувајќи ги трите линии на истражување: мултизадачно учење, јазичност и интерпретабилност. На основа на хипотезите кои се извлечени од лингвистичката теорија, истражуваме дали јазичките модели се согласуваат со принципите на учење на мултизадачи за време на обуката. За да ја покажеме идејата, ние го анализираме генерализациското однесување на јазичките модели додека тие го научуваат јазичкиот концепт на негативни полиарни елементи (НПИ). Нашите експерименти покажуваат дека поставувањето на мултизадачи природно се појавува во рамките на целта на поопштата задача на моделирање на јазиците. Ние тврдиме дека ова разбирање е вредно за учењето на мултизадачи, лингвистиката и истражувањето за интерпретабилност и може да доведе до возбудливи нови откритија во сите три домени.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡലില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാണ്, മൂന്നു പ്രശ്നങ്ങളുടെ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നത്: പല പണിയുടെ പഠ ഭാഷ തിയറിയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ഹൈപ്പിയറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു, പരിശീലിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പല് ആശയത്തെ കാണിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളുടെ സ്വഭാവം നമ്മള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. അവര്\u200d നെഗേറ്റിവ് പോളാരിറ്റി ഇനങ്ങളുടെ ഭാഷ കാര്യങ നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു, ഒരു പല്ലാ ജോലിയുടെ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമായി പുറത്തുവരു We argue that this insight is valuable for multi-task learning, linguistics and interpretability research and can lead to exciting new findings in all three domains.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu li nistudjaw l-immudellar tal-lingwi bħala problem a b’ħafna kompiti, u niġbru flimkien tliet oqsma ta’ riċerka: tagħlim b’ħafna kompiti, lingwistika, u interpretabbiltà. Abbażi ta’ ipotesi derivati mit-teorija lingwistika, ninvestigaw jekk il-mudelli lingwistiċi jikkonformawx mal-prinċipji tat-tagħlim ta’ tagħlim multikompiti matul it-taħriġ. Biex niġu murija l-idea, nagħmlu analiżi tal-imġiba ta’ ġeneralizzazzjoni tal-mudelli lingwistiċi hekk kif jitgħallmu l-kunċett lingwistiku ta’ Elementi ta’ Polarità Negattiva (NPIs). L-esperimenti tagħna juru li ambjent multikompitu naturalment joħroġ fi ħdan l-għan tal-kompitu aktar ġenerali tal-mudellar tal-lingwi. Aħna jargumentaw li dan l-għarfien huwa ta’ valur għat-tagħlim multikompiti, ir-riċerka lingwistika u l-interpretabbiltà u jista’ jwassal għal sejbiet ġodda eċċitanti fit-tliet oqsma kollha.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule proponujemy badanie modelowania języka jako problemu wielozadaniowego, łączącego trzy kierunki badań: uczenie się wielozadaniowe, lingwistykę i interpretowalność. W oparciu o hipotezy wywodzące się z teorii językowej badamy, czy modele językowe przestrzegają zasad uczenia się wielozadaniowego w trakcie szkolenia. Aby zaprezentować tę ideę, analizujemy zachowanie uogólniające modele językowe w trakcie nauki językowej koncepcji ujemnych elementów polarności (NPI). Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że wielozadaniowe ustawienie naturalnie pojawia się w ramach celu bardziej ogólnego zadania modelowania języka. Twierdzimy, że wniosek ten jest cenny dla wielozadaniowego uczenia się, lingwistyki i badań nad interpretacją i może prowadzić do ekscytujących nowych odkryć we wszystkich trzech dziedzinach.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, propunem studierea modelului lingvistic ca o problemă cu mai multe sarcini, reunind trei fire de cercetare: învățarea cu mai multe sarcini, lingvistica și interpretabilitatea. Pe baza ipotezelor derivate din teoria lingvistică, investigăm dacă modelele lingvistice aderă la principiile de învățare ale învățării multi-task în timpul formării. Pentru a prezenta ideea, analizăm comportamentul de generalizare al modelelor lingvistice pe măsură ce acestea învață conceptul lingvistic de elemente de polaritate negativă (NPI). Experimentele noastre demonstrează că un cadru multi-task apare în mod natural în cadrul obiectivului sarcinii mai generale a modelării limbajului. Susținem că această perspectivă este valoroasă pentru învățarea cu mai multe sarcini, cercetarea lingvistică și interpretabilitate și poate duce la noi descoperiri interesante în toate cele trei domenii.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэлний моделийг олон ажлын асуудал болгон судлах, олон ажлын суралцлага, хэлний болон ойлголтын 3 хэсэг бүрдүүлэхийг санал болгодог. Холбооны онолын үндсэн гипотезүүд дээр бид хэл загварууд суралцах үед олон ажлын суралцах үндсэн зарчмыг хадгалах эсэхийг судалж байна. Эдгээр санааг харуулахын тулд бид хэл загварын ерөнхийлөгчийн үйл ажиллагааг шинжилдэг. Тэд хэл загварын сөрөг Polarity Items (NPIs) болон хэл загварын ойлголтыг сурах үед. Бидний туршилтууд хэл загварын илүү ерөнхий даалгаварын зорилго дээр олон даалгаварын төлөвлөгөө байдаг гэдгийг харуулдаг. Бид энэ ойлголтыг олон ажлын суралцах, хэлний судалгаа, ойлголтын судалгаанд үнэ цэнэтэй гэж хэлж байна. Тэгээд 3 хэсэгт шинэ ололтууд сэтгэл хөдлөл өгч чадна.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მინდომა მრავალური საქმედების პრობლემა, სამრავალური სწავლება, ლუნგურისტიკა და ინტერპუქტურაცია, მრავალური საქმედების სწავლება. ჰიპოტესები, რომლებიც ლინგურისტიკის თეორიდან გამოვიყენებულია, ჩვენ განსხვავებთ თუ ენის მოდელები მრავალ რაოდენობის სწავლების პრინფესების გასწავლებას და იდეას ჩვენ ანალიზებთ ენის მოდელების გენერალიზაციის ქცევის, როგორც ისინი ვისწავლენ ნეგრატიური პოლიციური ელემენტების ლენგურისტიკური კონფიგურაცია. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენებენ, რომ მრავალ დავალების განსაზღვრება ნართლად იქნება ენის მოდელეციის უფრო საერთო დავალების მიხედვით. ჩვენ ვთქვათ, რომ ეს შესახებ უფრო მრავალური დასწავლებისთვის, ლენგურისტიკის და ინტერფლიქციის შესახებისთვის უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია და შეგვიძლია გავაკეთოთ ახალი შესაძლებ', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo da proučimo jezičku modelizaciju kao multi task problem, skupljajući tri strane istraživanja: multitask učenje, jezička i interpretabilnost. Na osnovu hipoteze iz jezičke teorije istražujemo da li se jezički modeli pridržavaju principima učenja multizadataka tokom obuke. Da bismo pokazali ideju, analizirali smo generalizaciju ponašanja jezičkih modela dok nauče jezički koncept negativnih poljoprivrednih elementa (NPI). Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da se prirodno pojavljuje multizadatak u cilju visokog zadataka jezika modeliranja. Tvrdimo da je ovaj uvid vrijedan za učenje multizadataka, istraživanje jezika i interpretabilnosti i može dovesti do uzbudljivih novih nalaza u svih tri domena.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි භාෂාව මොඩිලික් විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ භාෂාවික සිද්ධානයෙන් පිළිගත්ත හිතාවේ අපි පරීක්ෂා කරනවා භාෂාවික මොඩේල් ඉගෙන ඉගෙන ගන්න බොහොමක් වැඩි අදහසක් පෙන්වන්න, අපි භාෂා මෝඩල් වල සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා කියලා, ඔවුන් භාෂාවික අදහසක් ඉගෙන ගන්නේ නැති ප අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා කියලා භාෂාව මොඩිල් විදියට වඩා සාමාන්\u200dය වැඩක් සැකසුම් ස්වභාව අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගොඩක් වැඩි වැඩි වැඩක් ඉගෙනීම, භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාත්මක සහ අභිවාදක විශ්වාස කරන්න සහ අ', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa in aan ku barano muuqashada luuqadda sida dhibaato shaqo badan oo kale, oo aan soo ururinno saddex xadhig oo waxbarasho ah: waxbarashada shaqo badan, luuqadaha iyo turjumidda. Sida lagu saleynayo labawejiilayaasha fikradda luuqada, waxaynu baaraynaa in qaababka luuqadu ay ku adagtaan waxbarashada aasaasada waxbarashada shaqo badan. Si aan u muujinno fikrada, waxaynu baaraynaa dabeecada dhaqanka ee muuqashada luuqada sida ay u bartaan fikrada afka (NPIs). Imtixaankayada waxay muujiyaan in xeerarka shaqada kala duduwan si dabiicadda ah u soo baxaan, taas oo ah qasabka ugu caadiga ah ee sameynta luuqada. Waxaynu ka sheekaynaynaa in aragtidan qiimaan yahay waxbarashada shaqada badan, waxbarashada luuqadaha iyo turjumaadda, waxayna ku heli karaan wax lagu xiisoodo saddexda meelood oo dhan.', 'no': 'I denne papiret foreslår vi å studera språk-modelleringa som eit multioppgåve problem, og å samla tre strengar av forskning: multioppgåver-læring, språk og tolkingsfeilighet. Basert på hipotesar utført frå lingvistiske teorie, så undersøker vi om språk-modeller legg til læringsprinsippar av fleire oppgåver i læring. For å visa ideen, analyserer vi den generelliseringsferda av språk-modeller som dei lærer språk-konsepten av negativ polaritetselement (NPI). Eksperimentane våre viser at eit fleire oppgåver-innstilling naturleg oppstår i målet av det meir generelle oppgåva for språk-modellering. Vi tvar at denne innsyninga er verdileg for å lære fleire oppgåver, språkningsforskning og interpreteringsforskning og kan føra til oppmerking av nye oppgåver i alle tre domene.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats föreslår vi att studera språkmodellering som ett multi-task problem, som sammanför tre forskningsområden: multi-task learning, lingvistik och tolkning. Utifrån hypoteser som härrör från språkteori undersöker vi om språkmodeller följer lärandeprinciperna för flerfunktionslärande under träning. För att visa upp idén analyserar vi språkmodellernas generaliseringsbeteende när de lär sig det språkliga begreppet Negative Polarity Items (NPI). Våra experiment visar att en multi-task inställning naturligt uppstår inom målet för den mer allmänna uppgiften språkmodellering. Vi menar att denna insikt är värdefull för multi-task learning, lingvistik och tolkningsforskning och kan leda till spännande nya fynd inom alla tre områden.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் பல பணி பிரச்சனையாக மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரியை கற்றுக்கொள்ள விரும்புகிறோம், மூன்று தொடர்பு ஆராய்ச்சியை  மொழி மாதிரிகள் பயிற்சியில் கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் போது பல பணி கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் குறிப்புகளின் தலைப்புகளை பொறுத்துக் கொள்ள இந்த கருத்தை காட்ட, நாம் மொழி மாதிரிகளின் பொதுவான செயல்பாட்டை ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம் ஏனெனில் அவர்கள் எதிர்மறை போலாரிடி உருப்படிகளி எங்கள் சோதனைகள் பல பணி அமைப்புகள் இயற்கையாகவே மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரியின் மேலும் பொதுவான செயல் உள்ளே வெளியேறுகிறது என் பல பணிகள் கற்றல், மொழிகள் மற்றும் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு ஆராய்ச்சிகளுக்கு இந்த கண்டுப்பாடு மதிப்புள்ளது என்று நாம் விவாதம் செய்கிறோம', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم نے زبان مدل کی تعلیم کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے ایک multi-task مشکل کے طور پر، تین سی سینڈ تحقیق جمع کرتا ہے: multi-task learning, linguistics, and interpretability. زبان نظریہ سے پھیرے ہوئے فرضیات پر، ہم نے تحقیق کیا کہ زبان مدلز تعلیم کے وقت بہت سی دنیا کی تعلیم کے قانون پر قائم ہیں. یہ نظر دکھانے کے لئے، ہم زبان مدلکوں کی عمومی رفتار کو تحقیق کرتے ہیں جب وہ منفی پولاریٹی موتوں کی زبان کی نظریہ سیکھتے ہیں۔ ہماری آزمائش دکھاتی ہے کہ زبان نمادلینگ کے زیادہ عمومی کام کے اندر ایک بہت سے کام کی تنظیم طبیعی طور پر ظاہر ہوتی ہے۔ ہم جھگڑتے ہیں کہ یہ بصیرت بہت سے کاموں کی تعلیم، زبان شناسی اور تعلیمات کی تحقیق کے لئے ارزش دار ہے اور ہر تین دامنوں میں نئی پیدا کرنے کے لئے اثر دیتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda biz bir necha vazifa muammolari sifatida tillar modelini o'rganish davomida, uchta ta ta'qishni birlashtirishni istaysizmi: ko'plab ish o'rganishni, tillikni, va tarjima qilish imkoniyatini. Lugʻlik teoridan tasavvur qilingan munosabatlar asosida, biz tillar modellarini o'rganishda ko'plab vazifa o'rganishda o'rganish qoidalarini o'rganishni anglatamiz. Bu g'oyani ko'rsatish uchun biz tilning umumiy modellarining xususiyatini aniqlamiz, chunki ular Negative Polarity Elementlarning (NPIs) tillarini o'rganadi. Our experiments demonstrate that a multi-task setting naturally emerges within the objective of the more general task of language modelling.  Biz murakkab qilamiz, bu ko'plab vazifani o'rganish, tillar va tarjima qilish uchun qiymatdir va hamma uchta domenada yangi narsalarni qiziqarish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị nghiên cứu mô phỏng ngôn ngữ như một vấn đề đa nhiệm vụ, kết hợp ba loại nghiên cứu: đa nhiệm vụ học, ngôn ngữ, và giải thích. Dựa trên giả thuyết ngôn ngữ học, chúng tôi nghiên cứu liệu các mô hình ngôn ngữ có phù hợp với các nguyên tắc học tập nhiều nhiệm vụ trong thời gian đào tạo. Để trưng bày ý tưởng, chúng tôi phân tích hành vi phổ biến của các mô- đun ngôn ngữ khi chúng học các khái niệm ngôn ngữ về các mục vùng cực âm (NPI). Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi chứng minh rằng một quy định đa nhiệm vụ hiển nhiên xuất hiện trong mục tiêu của việc mô phỏng ngôn ngữ. Chúng tôi cho rằng cái nhìn này có giá trị cho nghiên cứu ngôn ngữ và giải thích nhiều nhiệm vụ và có thể dẫn tới những khám phá mới thú vị trong cả ba lĩnh vực.', 'nl': "In dit artikel stellen we voor om taalmodellering te bestuderen als een multitask probleem, waarbij drie onderzoekslijnen samenkomen: multitask leren, taalkunde en interpreteerbaarheid. Op basis van hypothesen uit de linguïstische theorie onderzoeken we of taalmodellen voldoen aan leerprincipes van multitask leren tijdens de training. Om het idee te presenteren analyseren we het generaliseringsgedrag van taalmodellen terwijl ze het linguïstische concept van Negative Polarity Items (NPI's) leren. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat een multitasking setting vanzelfsprekend ontstaat binnen de doelstelling van de meer algemene taak van taalmodellering. Wij stellen dat dit inzicht waardevol is voor multitasking learning, linguïstiek en interpreteerbaarheidsonderzoek en kan leiden tot spannende nieuwe bevindingen in alle drie de domeinen.", 'da': "I denne artikel foreslår vi at studere sprogmodellering som et multi-task problem, der samler tre strenge af forskning: multi-task learning, lingvistik og fortolkning. Med udgangspunkt i hypoteser udledt af sprogteori undersøger vi, om sprogmodeller overholder læringsprincipperne for multi-task learning under træning. For at fremvise ideen analyserer vi sprogmodellernes generaliseringsadfærd, når de lærer det sproglige begreb Negative Polarity Items (NPI'er). Vores eksperimenter viser, at der naturligvis opstår flere opgaver inden for målsætningen om sprogmodellering. Vi hævder, at denne indsigt er værdifuld for multi-task learning, lingvistik og fortolkningsforskning og kan føre til spændende nye resultater inden for alle tre områder.", 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo proučavati jezičku modelizaciju kao multizadatačni problem, skupljanje tri strane istraživanja: multizadatačno učenje, jezička i interpretabilnost. Na temelju hipoteze iz jezičke teorije, istražujemo da li se jezički modeli pridržavaju principima učenja višestrukog učenja tijekom obuke. Da bismo pokazali ideju, analizirali smo generalizaciju ponašanja jezičkih modela kako uče jezički koncept negativnih poljoprivrednih predmeta (NPI). Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da se prirodno pojavljuje višezadatak u cilju općeg zadatka modeliranja jezika. Tvrdimo da je taj uvid vrijedan za učenje multizadataka, istraživanje jezika i interpretabilnosti i može dovesti do uzbudljivih novih nalaza u svih tri domena.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия предлагаме изучаване на езиковото моделиране като многозададен проблем, обединявайки три направления на изследванията: многозадачно обучение, лингвистика и интерпретативност. Въз основа на хипотези, произтичащи от лингвистичната теория, изследваме дали езиковите модели се придържат към учебните принципи на многофункционалното обучение по време на обучението. За да покажем идеята, анализираме обобщаващото поведение на езиковите модели, докато те изучават езиковата концепция за елементи с отрицателна полярност (НПО). Експериментите ни демонстрират, че в рамките на по-общата задача на езиковото моделиране естествено възниква многозадача. Ние твърдим, че това прозрение е ценно за многофункционалното обучение, лингвистиката и изследванията за интерпретацията и може да доведе до вълнуващи нови открития във всичките три области.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir vor, Sprachmodellierung als Mehraufgabenproblem zu untersuchen, indem wir drei Forschungsbereiche zusammenführen: Mehraufgabenlernen, Linguistik und Interpretierbarkeit. Basierend auf Hypothesen aus der linguistischen Theorie untersuchen wir, ob Sprachmodelle Lernprinzipien des Multitask-Lernens während des Trainings einhalten. Um die Idee zu präsentieren, analysieren wir das Verallgemeinerungsverhalten von Sprachmodellen beim Erlernen des linguistischen Konzepts negativer Polaritätselemente (NPIs). Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass im Rahmen der allgemeineren Aufgabe der Sprachmodellierung natürlich ein Multitasking Setting entsteht. Wir argumentieren, dass diese Erkenntnisse wertvoll für Multi-Task Learning, Linguistik und Deutbarkeitsforschung sind und zu spannenden neuen Erkenntnissen in allen drei Bereichen führen können.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan untuk mempelajari model bahasa sebagai masalah multi-tugas, mengumpulkan tiga garis penelitian: belajar multi-tugas, bahasa, dan interpretasi. Berdasarkan hipotesis yang berasal dari teori bahasa, kami menyelidiki apakah model bahasa mengikuti prinsip belajar multi task dalam pelatihan. Untuk menunjukkan ide ini, kami menganalisis perilaku generalisasi dari model bahasa saat mereka belajar konsep bahasa dari Item Polaritas Negatif (NPI). Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa pengaturan multi-tugas secara alami muncul dalam tujuan tugas yang lebih umum dari model bahasa. Kami berdebat bahwa pandangan ini berharga untuk belajar multi-tugas, bahasa dan penelitian interpretabilitas dan dapat menyebabkan penemuan baru yang menarik di semua tiga bidang.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 언어 모델링을 다중 임무 문제로 연구하고 세 가지 연구 분야를 결합시키는 것을 제안한다. 그것이 바로 다중 임무 학습, 언어학과 해석성이다.언어학 이론의 가설을 바탕으로 우리는 언어 모델이 훈련 중의 다중 임무 학습의 학습 원칙에 부합되는지 연구했다.이러한 생각을 보여주기 위해 음극성 항목(NPI)의 언어 개념을 학습할 때 언어 모델의 일반화 행위를 분석했다.우리의 실험은 언어 모델링이라는 보다 일반적인 임무의 목표 범위 내에서 다중 임무 설정이 자연히 나타날 수 있음을 나타냈다.우리는 이 견해가 다목적 학습, 언어학, 해석적 연구에 매우 가치가 있고, 이 세 가지 분야에서 사람을 진작시키는 새로운 발견을 가져올 수 있다고 생각한다.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که مدل\u200cسازی زبان را به عنوان یک مشکل چند کار مطالعه کنیم، با جمع کردن سه قسمت تحقیقات: یادگیری چند کار، زبان\u200cشناسی و تعبیر قابلیت. بر اساس فرضیه\u200cهایی که از نظریه\u200cی زبان\u200cشناسی به دست آورده\u200cاند، تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که آیا مدل\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی در طول آموزش اصول\u200cهای یادگیری از تعلیم تعلیم\u200cکننده\u200cهای زیادی کار می\u200cکنند. برای نشان دادن این ایده، ما رفتار عمومی مدلهای زبان را تحلیل می کنیم، در حالی که آنها مفهوم زبان\u200cشناسی را یاد می\u200cگیرند. آزمایشات ما نشان می دهند که یک تنظیم چندین کار طبیعی در مورد هدف عمومی بیشتری از مدل زبان بیرون می آید. ما بحث می\u200cکنیم که این بحث برای یادگیری چند کار، زبان\u200cشناسی و تحقیقات تعبیر قابلیت ارزشمند است و می\u200cتواند به یادگیری جدید در هر سه دامنه هیجان\u200cانگیز باشد.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, biz diller modelleýäni köp-täblik mesele diýip öwrenmegi teklip edýäris, üç topar ylmy bilen gatnaşyp bilýäris: köp-täblik öwrenmek, lingwistikler we terjimeler. Lingstiki teoriýadan döredilen hypotezelere görä, biz dil nusgalarynyň multi-täbli öwrenmeniň prinsipleriniň öwrenmegi üçin baglanýandygyny soradyk. Fikiri görkezmek üçin, dil nusgalaryň (NPI) lingwistiki düşünjegini çykyp bilmeklerini çözeriz. Biziň deneylerimiz köp-täblik düzenlemek adatça dil modelleýşiniň umumy maksadynda görünýär. Biz bu düşünjäniň birnäçe işi öwrenmek, lingwistikler we ýazgytlyk barlamasynyň deňli bolandygyny aýtdyrýarys we bu düşünjäniň ähli üç sahypada täze bir tapylygy örän täze bolup biler.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza kusoma mifano ya lugha kama tatizo la kazi nyingi, kukusanya viungo vitatu vya utafiti: kujifunza kazi nyingi, lugha na tafsiri. Kutokana na imani zinazotokana na nadharia ya lugha, tunachunguza kama mifano ya lugha inaweza kujifunza kanuni za kujifunza kwa kazi nyingi wakati wa mafunzo. Ili kuonyesha wazo hilo, tunachambua tabia za kutengeneza mifano ya lugha wakati wanajifunza dhana ya lugha za vitu vinavyotarajiwa (NPIs). Our experiments demonstrate that a multi-task setting naturally emerges within the objective of the more general task of language modelling.  Tunajadili kuwa mwelekeo huu una thamani kwa kujifunza kwa kazi nyingi, utafiti wa lugha na tafsiri na unaweza kusababisha matokeo mapya katika maeneo yote matatu.', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም ቋንቋን ምሳሌ ብዙዎች የስራ ጉዳይ መሆኑን እናስተምረዋለን፣ ሦስት የጥናት ምርመራ ማሰናከል፣ ብዙ ስራ ትምህርት፣ ቋንቋዎች እና ትርጓሜን እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ ከቋንቋዊ ታሪክ የተገኘውን ንፍቅና በመሠረት ላይ፣ ቋንቋዎች ሞዴሌዎች በሙሉ ትምህርት ውስጥ የብዙ ስራ ትምህርት ትምህርት መሆኑን እናመርምራለን፡፡ አሳቡን ለማሳየት፣ የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎችን የቋንቋ አካባቢ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን ብዙዎችን የስራ ማቀናጃ በተለይ የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎችን በሚያሳየው አካባቢ ውስጥ እንዲወጣ ያሳያል፡፡ ይህ ዓይነት ለብዙ ስራ ትምህርት፣ ቋንቋዎች እና ትርጉም ማህበረሰብ ዋጋ እንዲሆን እና በሦስት ሀገሮች ሁሉ አዲስ ፍጥረት ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡', 'sq': 'In this paper, we propose to study language modelling as a multi-task problem, bringing together three strands of research: multi-task learning, linguistics, and interpretability.  Bazuar në hipotezat e nxjerra nga teoria gjuhësore, ne hetojmë nëse modelet gjuhësore respektojnë parimet e mësimit të mësimit me shumë detyra gjatë trajnimit. Për të treguar idenë, ne analizojmë sjelljen e gjeneralizimit të modeleve gjuhësore ndërsa ata mësojnë konceptin gjuhësor të elementeve negative të poliaritetit (NPI). Eksperimentet tona demonstrojnë se një vendosje shumëdetyrash shfaqet natyralisht brenda objektivit të detyrës më të përgjithshme të modelimit gjuhësor. Ne argumentojmë se ky kuptim është i vlefshëm për mësimin shumëdetyror, gjuhësinë dhe kërkimin e interpretueshmërisë dhe mund të çojë në gjetje të reja emocionuese në të tre fushat.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, voorstel ons om taal modellering as 'n multi-taak probleem te ondersoek, om drie ondersoek saam te bring: multi-taak leer, lingwisiese en interpretasie. Op hipotees afgeleide van lingwisiese teoriee, ondersoek ons of taal modele aanhou aan die leer van multi-taak-leer tydens onderwerp. Om die idee te wys, analyseer ons die generalisering gedrag van taal modele as hulle leer die lingwisiese konsepte van Negatiewe Polêrisiteit Items (NPIs). Ons eksperimente wys dat 'n multi-taak instelling natuurlik binne die doel van die meer algemene taak van taal modellering uitkom. Ons argumenteer dat hierdie insig waardelik is vir multi-taak leer, lingwisiese en uitleggbare ondersoek en kan lei na opkomstige nuwe vindings in alle drie domeine.", 'az': 'Bu kağızda, dil modellərini çoxlu iş problemi kimi təhsil etməyi təklif edirik, üç dəstə təhsil edirik: çoxlu iş öyrənməsi, dil dillərini və təfsil edilməsi. Dil teoriyasından gələn hipotezlərə görə, dil modellərinin öyrənməsi üçün çoxlu iş öyrənməsi təhsilinə uyğun müəyyən edilməsi müəyyən edirik. Düşünü göstərmək üçün, dil modellerinin generalizasyon davranışlarını, onlar Negativ Polarity Elementlərin (NPI) dillərini öyrəndikləri kimi analizi edirik. Bizim təcrübələrimiz çoxlu işlər qurması təbiətlə dil modellərinin daha genel işlərinin məqsədilə ortaya çıxdığını göstərir. Biz mübahisə edirik ki, bu düşüncə çoxlu işin öyrənməsi, dil-istiqaməti və təfsil edilməsi üçün qiymətlidir və üç sahədə yeni keşfetmə yolu göstərə bilər.', 'ca': "En aquest paper, proposem estudiar la modelació lingüística com un problem a multitascat, reunint tres rames de recerca: aprenentatge multitascat, lingüística i interpretabilitat. Sobre la base d'hipòtesis derivades de la teoria lingüística, investigam si els models lingüístics es conformen als principis d'aprenentatge d'aprenentatge multitasca durant l'entrenament. Per mostrar la idea, analitzem el comportament de generalització dels models de llenguatge mentre aprenen el concepte lingüístic d'elements de polaritat negativa. Els nostres experiments demostren que un entorn multitascat apareix naturalment dins l'objectiu de la tasca més general de modelar idiomes. We argue that this insight is valuable for multi-task learning, linguistics and interpretability research and can lead to exciting new findings in all three domains.", 'hy': "Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք ուսումնասիրել լեզվի մոդելավորումը որպես բազմախնդիր, միացնելով ուսումնասիրության երեք ոլորտ' բազմախնդիր սովորելը, լեզվաբանությունը և թարգմանելիությունը: Հիմնված լեզվաբանական տեսության հիպոթեզների վրա, մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, արդյոք լեզվաբանական մոդելները համապատասխանում են կրթության ընթացքում բազմախնդիրների սովորելու սկզբունքներին: Այս գաղափարը ցույց տալու համար մենք վերլուծում ենք լեզվի մոդելների ընդհանուր վարքագիծը, երբ նրանք սովորում են բացասական պոլարիտության տարրերի լեզվաբանական գաղափարը: Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ բազմախնդիրների միջավայրը բնական է առաջանում լեզվի մոդելավորման առավել ընդհանուր խնդիրների մեջ: Մենք պնդում ենք, որ այս ընկալումը արժեքավոր է բազմախնդիրների ուսումնասիրության, լեզվաբանության և մեկնաբանելիության համար, և կարող է հանգեցնել հետաքրքիր նոր հայտնաբերությունների բոլոր երեք ոլորտներում:", 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo da proučimo jezičku modelizaciju kao multi task problem, skupljajući tri strane istraživanja: multitask učenje, jezička i interpretabilnost. Na temelju hipoteze iz jezičke teorije, istražujemo da li se jezički modeli pridržavaju principima učenja multizadataka tijekom obuke. Da bismo pokazali ideju, analizirali smo generalizaciju ponašanja jezičkih modela dok uče jezički koncept negativnih poljoprivrednih elementa (NPI). Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da se prirodno pojavljuje multizadatak u cilju općeg zadatka modeliranja jezika. Tvrdimo da je taj uvid vrijedan za učenje multizadataka, istraživanje jezika i interpretabilnosti i može dovesti do uzbudljivih novih nalaza u svih tri domena.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku navrhujeme studovat jazykové modelování jako víceúlohový problém, který spojuje tři oblasti výzkumu: víceúlohové učení, lingvistiku a interpretovatelnost. Na základě hypotéz odvozených z lingvistické teorie zkoumáme, zda jazykové modely dodržují učební principy multi-tasking učení během tréninku. Pro prezentaci této myšlenky analyzujeme generalizační chování jazykových modelů při učení se jazykového konceptu negativních položek polarity (NPI). Naše experimenty ukazují, že víceúlohové nastavení se přirozeně objevuje v rámci cíle obecnějšího úkolu jazykového modelování. Tvrdíme, že tento pohled je cenný pro víceúlohové učení, lingvistiku a výzkum interpretovatelnosti a může vést k vzrušujícím novým poznatkům ve všech třech oblastech.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা অনেক কাজের সমস্যা হিসেবে ভাষার মডেল গবেষণা প্রস্তাব করি, তিনটি গবেষণার সাথে একত্রিত করার প্রস্তাব করি: বহুকাজ শিক্ষা,  ভাষাগত তত্ত্ব থেকে বিশেষ ধারণার ভিত্তিতে আমরা অনুসন্ধান করি ভাষার মডেল প্রশিক্ষণের সময় মাল্টিক কাজ শিক্ষার নীতিগুলো শিক্ষ এই ধারণা দেখানোর জন্য আমরা ভাষার মডেলের সাধারণ আচরণ বিশ্লেষণ করি যেহেতু তারা নেগেটিভ পোলারিটি বিষয়ের (এনপিআই) ভাষাগত ধারণা শিখে। আমাদের পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে অনেক কাজের স্বাভাবিকভাবে ভাষার মডেলের সবচেয়ে সাধারণ কাজের উদ্দেশ্যের মধ্যে একটি সা আমরা যুক্তি দিচ্ছি যে এই দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি মাল্টিক কাজ শিক্ষা, ভাষার ভাষা এবং ব্যাখ্যাত গবেষণার জন্য মূল্যবান এবং তিন ডোমেইনে তিনট', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös teeme ettepaneku uurida keele modelleerimist kui mitmeülesandelist probleemi, koondades kolm uurimisvaldkonda: mitmeülesandeline õpe, lingvistika ja tõlgendatavus. Keeleteooriast tulenevate hüpoteeside põhjal uurime, kas keelemudelid järgivad koolituse ajal mitmeülesandelise õppe õppepõhimõtteid. Idee tutvustamiseks analüüsime keelemudelite üldist käitumist, kui nad õpivad keelelist kontseptsiooni negatiivsetest polaarsustest elementidest. Meie eksperimendid näitavad, et keele modelleerimise ülesande eesmärgi raames tekib loomulikult mitmeülesandeline seadistus. Väidame, et see ülevaade on väärtuslik mitmeülesandelise õppe, keeleteaduse ja tõlgendatavuse uurimise jaoks ning võib viia põnevate uute avastusteni kõigis kolmes valdkonnas.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä ehdotamme kielimallinnuksen tutkimista monitehtäväongelmana yhdistäen kolme tutkimuslohkoa: monitehtäväoppiminen, kielitiede ja tulkittavuus. Kieliteoriasta johdettujen hypoteesien pohjalta tutkimme, noudattavatko kielimallit koulutuksen aikana monitehtävän oppimisen oppimisperiaatteita. Idean esittelyksi analysoimme kielimallien yleistymiskäyttäytymistä, kun ne oppivat negatiivisen polaarisuuden (NPI) kielellisen käsitteen. Kokemuksemme osoittavat, että monikäyttöinen asetelma syntyy luonnollisesti yleisemmän kielimallinnuksen tavoitteen puitteissa. Väitämme, että tämä näkemys on arvokas monitehtäväoppimisen, kielitieteen ja tulkittavuuden tutkimuksen kannalta ja voi johtaa jännittäviin uusiin löydöksiin kaikilla kolmella alalla.', 'jv': 'Nang pebuk iki, kita supoyo nggambar tarjamahan kanggo ngilangno sistem multi-task, nambah telu sing perusahaan kanggo ngilangno multi-task: multi-task Learning, Linguistik lan ijol-ijolan. NgaNgawe basa suprotekan sing suku kelangan limengan theori, awak dhéwé ujian model anyar nggawe barang pengguna kuwi tindakan multi-task seneng pisan ndeleng cara-cara Ngawe ngerti pawarno sing, kéné ngerasakno perbudhakan ning model sing luwih (NPIs). Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk ngerasai kanggo ngerasai akeh multi-task kang dadi kapan mulai nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan kanggo model urip. Awak dhéwé éntuk kuwi nggawe barang kanggo kelangan liyane karo multi-task lan kelangan langgambar lan basa kanggo ranjut kuwi bisa ngubah dhéwé, ngelarang ijol-ijolan winih sing is in é awak dhéwé.', 'ha': "Daga wannan takardan, Munã kwaɗayin mu karanta misalin harshen kamar wata matabbata mai aiki mai yawa, da ke samun takardar littafan uku: karantar aiki masu yawa, linguistic da fassarar. Basan da misãlai da aka zo daga littafin harshen, za mu yi ƙidãya, ko misalin harshe sun yi adadi da karatun karatun masu baran aiki masu yawa a lokacin da za'a karanta. To idan ya nuna zato, za mu yi anayyar aikin mai jama'a da misãlai na harshe kamar yadda za su sanar da zato na'urar-harshen abu na Nenegative Polarity (NPIs). Kayan jarrabõyinmu sun nuna cewa wani ma'aunin aiki mai yawa na fita a cikin kashin da ke ƙara wani aikin da ke samu'a cikin misalin harshe. Munã faɗa cewa wannan gani yana da kimada ga karanta masu aikin aiki mai yawa, fassarar harshen da fassarar fassarar, kuma yana iya ƙara wa fassarar mutane cikin dukkan uku.", 'sk': 'V prispevku predlagamo preučevanje jezikovnega modeliranja kot večopravilnega problema, ki združuje tri sklope raziskav: večopravilno učenje, jezikoslovje in interpretebilnost. Na podlagi hipotez iz jezikovne teorije raziskujemo, ali jezikovni modeli med usposabljanjem upoštevajo učna načela večopravilnega učenja. Da bi predstavili idejo, analiziramo generalizacijsko vedenje jezikovnih modelov, ko se učijo jezikovnega koncepta negativnih polarnostnih elementov (NPI). Naši eksperimenti kažejo, da se v cilju splošnejše naloge jezikovnega modeliranja naravno pojavlja večopravilna postavitev. Trdimo, da je ta vpogled dragocen za večopravilno učenje, jezikoslovje in raziskave razlagalnosti ter lahko vodi do zanimivih novih ugotovitev na vseh treh področjih.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים ללמוד דוגמנית שפת כבעיה רבה משימות, לאחד שלושה חוטים של מחקר: למידה רבה משימות, שפתית, ויכולת לפרש. בהתבסס על היפותזיות שנוצאות מתיאוריה שפתית, אנו חוקרים אם דוגמניות שפת מתאימות לעקרונות למידה של למידה רבת משימות במהלך האימון. כדי להראות את הרעיון, אנו מנתחים את התנהגות הגנרליזציה של דוגמני שפה כשהם לומדים את הרעיון השפתי של פריטי פוליריות שליליים (NPIs). הניסויים שלנו מראים שסדר משימות רבות מתגלה באופן טבעי בתוך המטרה של המשימה הגנרלית יותר של דוגמנית שפה. אנחנו מתווכחים שהתובנה הזאת היא חשובה ללימודים במשימות רבות, למחקר שפתית ומחקר היכולת לפרשנות ויכולה להוביל לממצאים חדשים מרגשים בכל שלושת התחומים.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་སྐད་རིགས་དབྱེ་བ་ལ་རྒྱས་ཁབ་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཆ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་སློབ་རྒྱུ་དང་།རྒྱལ་ཁབ་འདི་གསུམ་སྟོན་རྒྱུ་དང་། གྲངས་སྐོར་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པར་ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཚོར་མེད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱེད་དགོས། ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་སྐད་རིགས འུ་ཅག་གིས་བསམ་བློ་གཏད་འདི་ལ་རྩལ་ཆེ་བ་སློབ་རྩོལ་བ། སྐད་རིགས་དང་སྐོར་བརྟན་བསམ་བློ་གཏད་རྐྱེན་ལ།'}
{'en': 'ChainCQG : Flow-Aware Conversational Question Generation', 'pt': 'ChainCQG: geração de perguntas conversacionais com reconhecimento de fluxo', 'es': 'ChainCQG: Generación de preguntas conversacionales con reconocimiento de flujo', 'ar': 'ChainCQG: إنشاء الأسئلة التحادثية الواعية بالتدفق', 'fr': 'ChainCQG\xa0: Génération de questions conversationnelles sensibles au flux', 'ja': 'ChainCQG ：フロー意識会話型質問生成', 'zh': 'ChainCQG曰:流感知言生也', 'ru': 'ChainCQG: генерация разговорных вопросов с учетом потока', 'ga': 'ChainCQG: Giniúint Cheisteanna Comhrá ar Shreabhadh Feasach', 'hi': 'ChainCQG: प्रवाह-जागरूक संवादी प्रश्न पीढ़ी', 'el': 'ChainCQG: Δημιουργία ερωτήσεων με γνώμονα τη ροή', 'hu': 'ChainCQG: Flow-Aware Conversational Question Generation', 'it': 'ChainCQG: Generazione di domande conversazionali consapevoli del flusso', 'ka': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'kk': 'ChainCQG: Flow- Aware Conversational Question Generation', 'mk': 'Ланц', 'ms': 'Rangkaian', 'lt': 'ChainCQG: Flow-Aware Conversational Questions Generation', 'ml': 'ചെയിന്\u200dസിക്യൂജി: ഫ്ലൂ- അറിയുന്ന സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ആവശ്യത്തിലെ ചോദ്യം ജനിപ്പിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Katina CQG: Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Mistoqsijiet Konversazzjonali ta’ Flow-Aware', 'pl': 'ChainCQG: Przepływowe generowanie pytań konwersacyjnych', 'ro': 'ChainCQG: Generarea întrebărilor conversaționale conștiente de flux', 'sr': 'ChainCQG: Generacija konverzacionalnih pitanja', 'so': 'ChainCQG: Flow-aware Conversational Question Generation', 'si': 'ChainCQG: Flow- Know Conversations Query', 'no': 'ChainCQG: Generering av språk-vekk-samtalespørsmål', 'sv': 'ChainCQG: Flödesbevidgad konversationsfrågsgenerering', 'mn': 'ChainCQG: Flow-Aware Conversational Question Generation', 'ta': 'சான்சிகியூஜி: பாய்வு- நன்கு தெரியும் உரையாடல் கேள்வி உருவாக்கம்', 'ur': 'ChainCQG: Flow-Aware Conversational Question Generation', 'vi': 'ChainCQG: Trình đổi câu hỏi Name', 'uz': 'ChainCQG: Saqlash soĘ»rovi yaratish', 'hr': 'ChainCQG: Generacija razgovora o Flow-Aware', 'da': 'ChainCQG: Flow-Aware Conversational Spørgsmål Generation', 'bg': 'ChainCQG: Създаване на разговорни въпроси, осъзнаващи потока', 'nl': 'ChainCQG: Flow-Aware Conversational Question Generatie', 'id': 'ChainCQG: Flow-Aware Conversational Question Generation', 'ko': 'ChainCQG: 독감 지식 대화 질문 생성', 'de': 'ChainCQG: Flow-Aware Conversational Question Generierung', 'fa': 'ChainCQG: Generation of Flow-Aware Conversational Question', 'tr': 'Sanal', 'af': 'ChainCQG: Flow- Aware Conversational Question Generation', 'sw': 'ChainCQG: Flow-Aware Conversational Question Generation', 'sq': 'RrjedhaCQG: Flow-Aware Conversational Question Generation', 'am': 'የቻይንCQG: የውሃ-Aware Conversational Question Generation', 'hy': 'CQG: Flow- Knowledge', 'az': 'ChainCQG: Flow-Aware Qonuşma Soruşu Generasyonu', 'bn': 'চ্যায়েনসিকিউজি: ফুল-পরিচিত কথোপকথন প্রশ্ন জেনারেশন', 'bs': 'ChainCQG: Generacija konverzacionalnih pitanja', 'ca': 'Cadena CQG: La generació de preguntes conversacionals', 'cs': 'ChainCQG: Generování konverzačních otázek s ohledem na tok', 'et': 'ChainCQG: vooluteadlik vestlusküsimuste genereerimine', 'fi': 'ChainCQG: Flow-Aware Conversational Question Generation', 'jv': 'CqG: Flow-Awae conversations question Generation', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'ChainCQG: Oblikovanje pogovornih vprašanj, ki se zavedajo pretoka', 'he': 'שרשרת', 'bo': 'ChainCQG: Flow-Aware Conversational Question Generation'}
{'en': 'Conversational systems enable numerous valuable applications, and question-answering is an important component underlying many of these. However, conversational question-answering remains challenging due to the lack of realistic, domain-specific training data. Inspired by this bottleneck, we focus on conversational question generation as a means to generate synthetic conversations for training and evaluation purposes. We present a number of novel strategies to improve conversational flow and accommodate varying question types and overall fluidity. Specifically, we design ChainCQG as a two-stage architecture that learns question-answer representations across multiple dialogue turns using a flow propagation training strategy. ChainCQG significantly outperforms both answer-aware and answer-unaware SOTA baselines (e.g., up to 48 % BLEU-1 improvement). Additionally, our model is able to generate different types of questions, with improved fluidity and coreference alignment.', 'fr': "Les systèmes conversationnels permettent de nombreuses applications utiles, et la réponse aux questions est un élément important sous-jacent à bon nombre d'entre elles. Cependant, les réponses aux questions conversationnelles restent difficiles en raison du manque de données de formation réalistes et spécifiques au domaine. Inspirés par ce goulot d'étranglement, nous nous concentrons sur la génération de questions conversationnelles afin de générer des conversations synthétiques à des fins de formation et d'évaluation. Nous présentons un certain nombre de nouvelles stratégies pour améliorer le flux conversationnel et s'adapter à différents types de questions et à la fluidité globale. Plus précisément, nous concevons ChainCQG comme une architecture en deux étapes qui apprend les représentations de questions-réponses à travers plusieurs tours de dialogue à l'aide d'une stratégie de formation de propagation de flux. ChainCQG surpasse de manière significative les lignes de base SOTA sensibles et non sensibles aux réponses (par exemple, jusqu'à 48% d'amélioration BLEU-1). De plus, notre modèle est capable de générer différents types de questions, avec une fluidité et un alignement de coréférence améliorés.", 'pt': 'Os sistemas de conversação permitem vários aplicativos valiosos, e a resposta a perguntas é um componente importante subjacente a muitos deles. No entanto, a resposta a perguntas de conversação continua sendo um desafio devido à falta de dados de treinamento realistas e específicos do domínio. Inspirados por esse gargalo, focamos na geração de perguntas conversacionais como forma de gerar conversas sintéticas para fins de treinamento e avaliação. Apresentamos uma série de novas estratégias para melhorar o fluxo de conversação e acomodar vários tipos de perguntas e fluidez geral. Especificamente, projetamos o ChainCQG como uma arquitetura de dois estágios que aprende representações de perguntas e respostas em vários turnos de diálogo usando uma estratégia de treinamento de propagação de fluxo. O ChainCQG supera significativamente as linhas de base SOTA com e sem resposta (por exemplo, até 48% de melhoria do BLEU-1). Além disso, nosso modelo é capaz de gerar diferentes tipos de perguntas, com maior fluidez e alinhamento de correferência.', 'ar': 'تتيح أنظمة المحادثة العديد من التطبيقات القيمة ، وتعد الإجابة عن الأسئلة مكونًا مهمًا يقوم عليه العديد من هذه التطبيقات. ومع ذلك ، تظل الإجابة على أسئلة المحادثة صعبة بسبب عدم وجود بيانات تدريب واقعية خاصة بالمجال. مستوحاة من هذا المأزق ، نركز على توليد أسئلة المحادثة كوسيلة لتوليد محادثات تركيبية لأغراض التدريب والتقييم. نقدم عددًا من الاستراتيجيات الجديدة لتحسين تدفق المحادثة واستيعاب أنواع الأسئلة المختلفة والسيولة الكلية. على وجه التحديد ، نقوم بتصميم ChainCQG كهيكل من مرحلتين يتعلم تمثيلات الأسئلة والأجوبة عبر عدة أدوار في الحوار باستخدام استراتيجية تدريب على انتشار التدفق. يتفوق ChainCQG بشكل ملحوظ على كلٍ من خطوط أساس SOTA المدركة للإجابة وغير المدركة للإجابة (على سبيل المثال ، ما يصل إلى 48٪ من تحسين BLEU-1). بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، فإن نموذجنا قادر على توليد أنواع مختلفة من الأسئلة ، مع تحسين السيولة ومحاذاة المرجع.', 'ja': '会話システムは、多数の貴重なアプリケーションを可能にし、質問への回答はこれらの多くの基礎となる重要なコンポーネントです。しかし、現実的なドメイン固有のトレーニングデータがないため、会話の質問に対する回答は依然として困難です。このボトルネックに触発されて、私たちはトレーニングと評価の目的で合成的な会話を生成する手段として、会話の質問生成に焦点を当てます。私たちは、会話の流れを改善し、さまざまな質問タイプと全体的な流動性に対応するためのいくつかの新しい戦略を提示します。具体的には、フロー伝播トレーニング戦略を使用して、複数の対話ターンにわたる質問応答表現を学習する2段階アーキテクチャとしてChainCQGを設計します。ChainCQGは、回答を認識しているSOTAベースラインと回答を認識していないSOTAベースラインの両方を大幅に上回ります（例えば、最大48 ％のBLEU -1改善）。さらに、当社のモデルは、流動性とコアリファレンスのアラインメントを改善して、さまざまなタイプの質問を生成することができます。', 'es': 'Los sistemas conversacionales permiten numerosas aplicaciones valiosas, y la respuesta a preguntas es un componente importante subyacente a muchas de ellas. Sin embargo, la respuesta conversacional a preguntas sigue siendo un desafío debido a la falta de datos de entrenamiento realistas y específicos del dominio. Inspirados por este cuello de botella, nos centramos en la generación de preguntas conversacionales como un medio para generar conversaciones sintéticas con fines de capacitación y evaluación. Presentamos una serie de estrategias novedosas para mejorar el flujo conversacional y adaptarse a los diferentes tipos de preguntas y la fluidez general. Específicamente, diseñamos ChainCQG como una arquitectura de dos etapas que aprende representaciones de preguntas y respuestas a través de múltiples turnos de diálogo mediante una estrategia de entrenamiento de propagación de flujo. ChainCQG supera significativamente los puntos de referencia de SOTA con y sin conocimiento de respuestas (por ejemplo, hasta un 48% de mejora en BLEU-1). Además, nuestro modelo es capaz de generar diferentes tipos de preguntas, con mayor fluidez y alineación de correferencias.', 'zh': '会话统多直应用程序,而问答多应用程序之要组成部分。 然以乏实、特定于领数,对式问答犹有挑战性。 受此瓶颈者,专于会话生成,以成培训评之一术也。 多新策以改对,各适其类流动性。 具体来说,设ChainCQG为两架构,以流教习为对。 ChainCQG之形明优于对案感知及对案感知SOTA基线(例,BLEU-1改进高达48%)。 吾形能成异类,更进流动性共指一致性。', 'hi': 'संवादी प्रणालियां कई मूल्यवान अनुप्रयोगों को सक्षम करती हैं, और प्रश्न-उत्तर इनमें से कई को अंतर्निहित एक महत्वपूर्ण घटक है। हालांकि, यथार्थवादी, डोमेन-विशिष्ट प्रशिक्षण डेटा की कमी के कारण संवादात्मक प्रश्न-उत्तर चुनौतीपूर्ण बना हुआ है। इस बाधा से प्रेरित होकर, हम प्रशिक्षण और मूल्यांकन उद्देश्यों के लिए सिंथेटिक वार्तालाप उत्पन्न करने के साधन के रूप में संवादी प्रश्न पीढ़ी पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। हम संवादी प्रवाह में सुधार करने और अलग-अलग प्रश्न प्रकारों और समग्र तरलता को समायोजित करने के लिए कई उपन्यास रणनीतियों को प्रस्तुत करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम ChainCQG को दो-चरण वास्तुकला के रूप में डिज़ाइन करते हैं जो प्रवाह प्रसार प्रशिक्षण रणनीति का उपयोग करके कई संवाद मोड़ों में प्रश्न-उत्तर प्रतिनिधित्व सीखता है। ChainCQG महत्वपूर्ण रूप से उत्तर-जागरूक और उत्तर-अनजान SOTA बेसलाइन (उदाहरण के लिए, 48% BLEU-1 सुधार तक) दोनों को मात देता है। इसके अतिरिक्त, हमारा मॉडल बेहतर तरलता और सह-सम्मेलन संरेखण के साथ विभिन्न प्रकार के प्रश्नों को उत्पन्न करने में सक्षम है।', 'ru': 'Разговорные системы обеспечивают многочисленные ценные приложения, и ответы на вопросы являются важным компонентом, лежащим в основе многих из них. Тем не менее, ответы на вопросы в ходе бесед остаются сложными из-за отсутствия реалистичных данных о профессиональной подготовке в конкретных областях. Вдохновленные этим узким местом, мы фокусируемся на генерации разговорных вопросов как средстве генерации синтетических бесед для целей обучения и оценки. Мы представляем ряд новых стратегий для улучшения разговорного потока и адаптации различных типов вопросов и общей текучести. В частности, мы проектируем ChainCQG как двухступенчатую архитектуру, которая изучает представления вопросов и ответов на протяжении нескольких диалоговых поворотов, используя стратегию обучения распространению потока. ChainCQG значительно превосходит базовые линии SOTA как с учетом ответов, так и без учета ответов (например, до 48% улучшения BLEU-1). Кроме того, наша модель способна генерировать различные типы вопросов с улучшенной текучестью и ориентацией на ядро.', 'ga': 'Cumasaíonn córais chomhrá go leor feidhmchláir luachmhara, agus tá freagra ceisteanna ina chomhpháirt thábhachtach mar bhonn le go leor díobh sin. Mar sin féin, tá sé dúshlánach fós ceisteanna a fhreagairt mar gheall ar an easpa sonraí réalaíocha oiliúna a bhaineann go sonrach leis an bhfearann. Agus an bac seo á spreagadh againn, dírímid ar cheist chomhrá a ghiniúint mar mhodh chun comhráite sintéiseacha a ghiniúint chun críocha oiliúna agus meastóireachta. Cuirimid roinnt straitéisí nua i láthair chun an sreabhadh comhrá a fheabhsú agus chun freastal ar chineálacha éagsúla ceisteanna agus ar sholúbthacht iomlán. Go sonrach, dearadh againn ChainCQG mar ailtireacht dhá-chéim a fhoghlaimíonn uiríll ceist-freagra ar fud casadh ilphlé ag baint úsáide as straitéis oiliúna iomadú sreafa. Feidhmíonn ChainCQG go suntasach níos fearr ná bunlínte SOTA atá feasach ar fhreagra agus ar fhreagraí (m.sh., suas le feabhsú 48% BLEU-1). Ina theannta sin, tá ár múnla in ann cineálacha éagsúla ceisteanna a ghiniúint, le solúbthacht feabhsaithe agus ailíniú croíláir.', 'ka': 'პარაუზაციური სისტემები უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი პროგრამების შესაძლებლობა, და კითხვა-პასუხი უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი კომპონენტია, რომელიც უ მაგრამ კითხვების შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი რეალური, დიომინური განსაბამისი მონაცემების შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი განმავლობა უ ჩვენ განვითარებით ამ ბრძნობით, ჩვენ განვითარებით კითხვების განვითარებით როგორც სინტეტიკური განსახულებების შექმნა საზოგადოებაში და განვითარებისთვის. ჩვენ აჩვენებთ რამდენიმე პრომენტური სტრატიგიები, რომელიც უფრო უფრო მეტად განსახვავებული კითხვის ტიპები და უფრო სინამდვილეობა. განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ ChainCQG-ს როგორც ორ ფაეჯის აქტიქტიქტურა, რომელიც კითხვა-პასუხის გამოსახულებების გამოყენება მრავალ დიალოგის განსახულებაში გამოყენება პ ChainCQG მნიშვნელოვანია გავამუშავებს ორივე განსხვავებული და განსხვავებული SOTA ბაზილის ხაზები (მაგალითად, 48% უფლება BLEU-1). დამატებით, ჩვენი მოდელის შესაძლებელია განსხვავებული ტიპი კითხვების შექმნა, რომლებიც უფრო უფრო მეტადებული სინამდვილეობა და სწორეობა.', 'hu': 'A beszélgetési rendszerek számos értékes alkalmazást tesznek lehetővé, és ezek közül sok fontos összetevő a kérdésválasz. A beszélgetési kérdések megválaszolása azonban továbbra is kihívást jelent a reális, területspecifikus képzési adatok hiánya miatt. Ennek a szűk keresztmetszetnek a inspirálására összpontosítunk a beszélgetési kérdések generálására, mint a képzési és értékelési célokra szolgáló szintetikus beszélgetések generálására. Számos új stratégiát mutatunk be a beszélgetési folyamat javítására, valamint a különböző kérdéstípusok és az általános folyamatosság alkalmazására. Konkrétan a ChainCQG-et egy kétlépcsős architektúrának tervezzük, amely több párbeszédfordulón keresztül tanulja meg a kérdés-válasz reprezentációkat egy áramlásterjesztési stratégia segítségével. A ChainCQG jelentősen felülmúlja mind a válasz-tudatos, mind a válasz-tudatlan SOTA alapvonalakat (pl. akár 48%-os BLEU-1 javulás). Emellett modellünk képes különböző típusú kérdéseket generálni, javított fluiditással és coreferencia igazítással.', 'el': 'Τα συστήματα συνομιλίας επιτρέπουν πολυάριθμες πολύτιμες εφαρμογές και η απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις είναι ένα σημαντικό στοιχείο που βασίζεται σε πολλές από αυτές. Ωστόσο, η απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις συνομιλίας παραμένει δύσκολη λόγω της έλλειψης ρεαλιστικών δεδομένων κατάρτισης που αφορούν τον τομέα. Εμπνευσμένοι από αυτό το εμπόδιο, εστιάζουμε στη δημιουργία ερωτήσεων συνομιλίας ως μέσο δημιουργίας συνθετικών συνομιλιών για σκοπούς εκπαίδευσης και αξιολόγησης. Παρουσιάζουμε μια σειρά από νέες στρατηγικές για τη βελτίωση της ροής συνομιλίας και την προσαρμογή διαφορετικών τύπων ερωτήσεων και της συνολικής ρευστότητας. Συγκεκριμένα, σχεδιάζουμε ως μια αρχιτεκτονική δύο σταδίων που μαθαίνει αναπαραστάσεις ερωτήσεων-απαντήσεων σε πολλαπλές στροφές διαλόγου χρησιμοποιώντας μια στρατηγική εκπαίδευσης διάδοσης ροής. Το ChainCQG ξεπερνά σημαντικά τόσο τις γραμμές βάσης SOTA που γνωρίζουν απαντήσεις όσο και τις γραμμές βάσης που δεν γνωρίζουν απαντήσεις (π.χ. βελτίωση έως 48% BLEU-1). Επιπλέον, το μοντέλο μας είναι σε θέση να δημιουργήσει διαφορετικούς τύπους ερωτήσεων, με βελτιωμένη ρευστότητα και ευθυγράμμιση μεταξύ τους.', 'it': "I sistemi di conversazione consentono numerose applicazioni preziose, e la risposta alle domande è una componente importante alla base di molte di queste. Tuttavia, la risposta alle domande conversazionali rimane difficile a causa della mancanza di dati realistici e specifici per il settore. Ispirati da questo collo di bottiglia, ci concentriamo sulla generazione di domande conversazionali come mezzo per generare conversazioni sintetiche per scopi di formazione e valutazione. Presentiamo una serie di nuove strategie per migliorare il flusso di conversazione e soddisfare diversi tipi di domande e fluidità complessiva. Nello specifico, progettiamo ChainCQG come un'architettura a due stadi che impara le rappresentazioni domande-risposte attraverso più turni di dialogo utilizzando una strategia di formazione sulla propagazione del flusso. ChainCQG supera significativamente sia le linee di base SOTA a risposta consapevole che a risposta inconsapevole (ad esempio, fino al 48% di miglioramento BLEU-1). Inoltre, il nostro modello è in grado di generare diversi tipi di domande, con un migliore allineamento di fluidità e coreferenza.", 'lt': 'Konversinės sistemos leidžia taikyti daug vertingų programų, o atsakymas į klausimus yra svarbi daugelio jų sudedamoji dalis. However, conversational question-answering remains challenging due to the lack of realistic, domain-specific training data.  Įkvėpę šį trūkumą, daugiausia dėmesio skiriame pokalbio klausimų kūrimui, kaip priemonėms kurti sintetinius pokalbius mokymo ir vertinimo tikslais. Pateikiame keletą naujų strategijų, kuriomis siekiama pagerinti pokalbių srautus ir pritaikyti įvairias klausimų rūšis bei bendrą skystumą. Konkrečiai, mes projektuojame ChainCQG kaip dviejų etapų architektūrą, kuri mokosi klausimų ir atsakymų atstovavimų įvairiuose dialogo posūkiuose naudojant srauto sklaidos mokymo strategiją. ChainCQG gerokai viršija SOTA bazinius rodiklius, žinomus apie atsakymus ir nežinomus apie atsakymus (pvz., iki 48 % BLEU-1 pagerėjimo). Be to, mūsų model is gali sukelti įvairių rūšių klausimus, pagerindamas skystumą ir suderinamumą.', 'mk': 'Конверзационалните системи овозможуваат бројни вредни апликации, а одговорот на прашањата е важен компонент на кој се наоѓаат многу од нив. Сепак, разговарачките одговори на прашања остануваат предизвикувачки поради недостатокот на реални, специфични податоци за обука на домените. Инспирирани од ова ќор-сокак, се фокусираме на генерацијата на разговарачки прашања како средство за генерација на синтетички разговори за обука и евалуација. Презентираме голем број нови стратегии за подобрување на разговорниот тек и прилагодување на различни типови на прашања и целокупна течност. Специфично, ние дизајнираме ChainCQG како двофазивна архитектура која научи претставувања на прашања и одговори низ повеќето дијалози вртења користејќи стратегија за обука за пропагација на текот. ChainCQG значително ги надминува базите на SOTA кои се свесни за одговорите и не се свесни за одговорите (на пример, до 48 отсто подобрување на BLEU-1). Покрај тоа, нашиот модел е во можност да генерира различни видови прашања, со подобрена течност и соодветно прилагодување.', 'ms': 'Sistem perbualan membolehkan banyak aplikasi berharga, dan jawapan-soalan adalah komponen penting yang mendasarkan banyak daripada ini. Namun, jawapan soalan percakapan tetap mencabar kerana kekurangan data latihan yang realistik, spesifik domain. Terinspirasi oleh keterangan ini, kami fokus pada generasi soalan perbualan sebagai cara untuk menghasilkan perbualan sintetik untuk tujuan latihan dan penilaian. Kami memperkenalkan beberapa strategi baru untuk meningkatkan aliran perbualan dan mengakomodasi jenis soalan yang berbeza dan keseluruhan cairan. Secara khusus, kita merancang ChainCQG sebagai arkitektur dua tahap yang mempelajari perwakilan soalan-jawapan melalui berbagai pusingan dialog menggunakan strategi latihan aliran. ChainCQG secara signifikan melebihi kedua-dua garis dasar SOTA yang menyadari jawapan dan tidak menyadari jawapan (cth., hingga 48% peningkatan BLEU-1). Lagipun, model kita mampu menghasilkan jenis soalan yang berbeza, dengan peningkatan cairan dan penyesuaian persamaan.', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d എത്ര വില പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമാക്കുന്നു. ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നത് ഇതില്\u200d പലര എന്നാലും സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ ഉത്തരം വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ കാരണമാണ്. ഡൊമെയി ഈ ബോട്ട്ലെന്\u200dസിക്കിന്\u200dറെ പ്രവേശിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ടത്, സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ തലമുറയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. പരി We present a number of novel strategies to improve conversational flow and accommodate varying question types and overall fluidity.  പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d ചെയിന്\u200dസിക്ക്യൂജിയെ രണ്ട് സ്റ്റേജിലെ ആര്\u200dക്കിക്കറ്റിക്കാരായി സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു. ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരവ ചെയിന്\u200dസിക്യൂജിയുടെ ഉത്തരം അറിയാവുന്നതും ഉത്തരം അറിയാത്ത സോട്ടാവിന്റെ ബേസ്ലൈനുകളും പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതും കൂടുതലായി പ കൂടാതെ, നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത തരം ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും, മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യാ', 'mt': 'Is-sistemi ta’ konverżjoni jippermettu għadd ta’ applikazzjonijiet ta’ valur, u t-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet hija komponent importanti li jissejjes fuq ħafna minn dawn. Madankollu, it-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet ta’ konverżjoni tibqa’ sfida minħabba n-nuqqas ta’ dejta realistika u speċifika għall-qasam ta’ taħriġ. Inspirati minn dan l-ostaklu, niffokaw fuq il-ġenerazzjoni ta’ mistoqsijiet ta’ konverżjoni bħala mezz biex niġġeneraw konverżjonijiet sintetiċi għal skopijiet ta’ taħriġ u evalwazzjoni. Aħna nippreżentaw għadd ta’ strateġiji ġodda biex itejbu l-fluss ta’ konverżjoni u nikkomodaw tipi differenti ta’ mistoqsijiet u fluwidità ġenerali. B’mod speċifiku, a ħna niddisinjaw il-ChainCQG bħala arkitettura f’żewġ stadji li titgħallem rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ mistoqsijiet u tweġibiet matul diversi drabi ta’ djalogu bl-użu ta’ strateġija ta’ taħriġ għall-propagazzjoni tal-flussi. Il-katina CQG taqbeż b’mod sinifikanti kemm il-linji bażi tas-SOTA li huma konxji mit-tweġibiet kif ukoll dawk li mhumiex konxji mit-tweġibiet (e ż., titjib sa 48% BLEU-1). Barra minn hekk, il-mudell tagħna huwa kapaċi jiġġenera tipi differenti ta’ mistoqsijiet, b’titjib fil-fluwidità u l-allinjament tal-koerenza.', 'pl': 'Systemy konwersacyjne umożliwiają liczne cenne aplikacje, a odpowiedzi na pytania są ważnym elementem wielu z nich. Jednak odpowiedź na pytania konwersacyjne pozostaje wyzwaniem ze względu na brak realistycznych, specyficznych dla danych szkoleniowych. Zainspirowani tym wąskim gardłem koncentrujemy się na generowaniu pytań konwersacyjnych jako sposobu generowania syntetycznych rozmów do celów szkoleniowych i ewaluacyjnych. Przedstawiamy szereg nowych strategii poprawiających przepływ konwersacji i uwzględniających różne typy pytań i ogólną płynność. W szczególności projektujemy ChainCQG jako dwustopniową architekturę, która uczy się reprezentacji pytań-odpowiedzi w wielu zwrotach dialogowych za pomocą strategii szkoleniowej propagacji przepływu. ChainCQG znacznie przewyższa zarówno linię bazową SOTA świadome odpowiedzi, jak i nieświadome odpowiedzi (np. poprawa do 48% BLEU-1). Dodatkowo nasz model jest w stanie generować różne rodzaje pytań, z lepszą płynnością i koreferencją.', 'kk': 'Динамикалық жүйелер көптеген мәнді қолданбаларды рұқсат ету және сұрақ жауап беру - осының көптеген маңызды компоненті. Бірақ, сұрақ жауап беру қажетті, доменге арналған оқыту деректері жоқ деген себебі көмектесілі болады. Бұл жетілдірілген сұрақтарды жасау үшін синтетикалық сұрақтарды оқыту мен оқыту мақсаттарының синтетикалық сұрақтарды құру үшін көңіл береміз. Біз қатынау жұмысын жақсарту және әртүрлі сұрақ түрлерін және әртүрлі жылдамдығын жақсарту үшін бірнеше жаңа стратегияларды таңдаймыз. Ескерілікті, ChainCQG дегенді бірнеше диалог бойынша сұрақ-жауаптарды көрсету архитекторы ретінде құрамыз. ChainCQG жауап бермейтін және жауап бермейтін SOTA негізгі жолдары (мысалы, BLEU- 1 деген жақсарту 48% дегенге дейін). Қосымша, біздің үлгіміз әртүрлі сұрақтарды жасауға мүмкіндік береді.', 'ro': 'Sistemele de conversație permit numeroase aplicații valoroase, iar răspunsul la întrebări este o componentă importantă care stă la baza multor dintre acestea. Cu toate acestea, răspunsul la întrebări conversaționale rămâne dificil din cauza lipsei de date realiste, specifice domeniului de formare. Inspirați de acest blocaj, ne concentrăm pe generarea de întrebări conversaționale ca mijloc de a genera conversații sintetice în scopuri de formare și evaluare. Prezentăm o serie de strategii noi pentru îmbunătățirea fluxului conversațional și adaptarea diferitelor tipuri de întrebări și fluiditate generală. Mai exact, proiectăm ChainCQG ca o arhitectură în două etape care învață reprezentările întrebări-răspunsuri în mai multe ture de dialog folosind o strategie de instruire de propagare a fluxului. ChainCQG depășește semnificativ atât liniile de referință SOTA conștiente de răspuns, cât și liniile de referință SOTA necunoscute de răspuns (de exemplu, îmbunătățirea BLEU-1 cu până la 48%). În plus, modelul nostru este capabil să genereze diferite tipuri de întrebări, cu o aliniere îmbunătățită a fluidității și coreferenței.', 'sr': 'Razgovorni sistemi omogućavaju brojne vrijedne aplikacije, a odgovor na pitanje je važan komponent pod mnogim od njih. Međutim, razgovorni odgovor na pitanje i dalje je izazovan zbog nedostatka realnih podataka o obuci u domenu. Inspirirali smo od ovog vrata, fokusiramo se na generaciju konverzacionog pitanja kao sredstvo za stvaranje sintetičkih razgovora za ciljeve obuke i procjene. Predstavljamo broj novih strategija za poboljšanje razgovornog toka i usmjerenje različitih vrsta pitanja i ukupne tekućine. Posebno, mi dizajniramo ChainCQG kao dve faze arhitekturu koja nauči zastupanje odgovora na pitanje preko višestrukog dijaloga, koristeći strategiju propagacije toka. ChainCQG značajno iznosi i osnovne linije SOTA-a bez odgovora i odgovora (npr. poboljšanje BLEU-1 do 48%. Osim toga, naš model je u stanju da stvori različite vrste pitanja, uz poboljšanje tekućine i usklađenje pristojnosti.', 'si': 'සංවාදය පද්ධතිය සක්\u200dරිය කරන්න විශේෂ විශේෂ යෝජනය, සහ ප්\u200dරශ්න- ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක්  නමුත්, ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරය ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ වෙන්නේ  මේ බෝට්ලන්ගෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට අවධානයක් විදියට ස අපි වෙනස් ප්\u200dරශ්න වර්ගයක් සහ සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්න වර්ගයක් සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් වැඩි කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න වි විශේෂයෙන්ම, අපි ChainCQG වින්යාස කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්න-උත්තර දෙකක් ස්ථානයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්න සංවාදයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ් ChainCQG ගොඩක් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිච්චාර දෙන්නම් ප්\u200dරතිචාර දැනගන්න පුළුවන් සහ ප්\u200dරතිචාර දෙන්නම් ප්\u200dරතිචාර දෙ තවත්, අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක වෙනස් ප්\u200dරශ්න වර්ගයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා, ප්\u200dරශ්න වර්ගයක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්න', 'no': 'Samtalesystemet slår på mange verdilege program, og spørsmål-svar er ein viktig komponent under mange av desse. Samtale spørsmål-svar er imidlertid vanskeleg på grunn av mangling av realistiske, domenespesifikke opplæringsdata. På denne botnehalen, fokuserer vi på generering av konvertasjonale spørsmål som måte å laga syntetiske samtaler for opplæring og evalueringsmål. Vi presenterer mange noverande strategiar for å forbetra konversjonsfløst og tilpassa ulike spørsmåltypar og overalt fluiditet. Spesielt, vi design ChainCQG som ein to stadige arkitektur som lærer representasjonar av spørsmål-svar på fleire dialogvindauge, gjer at du brukar ein strategi for sprettopplegging. ChainCQG utfører både SOTA-baselinjer med svar og svar-ikkje-vare (f.eks. opp til 48 % forbetringa av BLEU-1). I tillegg kan modellen vårt lage ulike typar spørsmål med forbetra fluiditet og koreferansen.', 'mn': 'Хариулт системүүд маш олон үнэ цэнэтэй хэрэглээ болох бөгөөд асуулт хариулт нь эдгээрийн ихэнх нь үнэ цэнэтэй компонент юм. Гэхдээ харилцааны асуулт хариулт нь бодит, холбоотой дасгал өгөгдлийн алдаагүй учраас хэцүү байдаг. Энэ завсарлагаас сэтгэл хөдлөл, бид харилцааны асуулт бий болгон суралцах нь сургалт болон үнэлгээний зорилгоор шинжлэх ухаан болох шинжлэх ухаан болгон төвлөрүүлдэг. Бид харилцааны урсгалыг сайжруулахын тулд олон шинэ стратегийг тайлбарлаж, олон асуулт төрлүүд болон нийтлэг шингэнд тусалдаг. Ялангуяа бид ChainCQG-г олон диалог дээр асуулт хариултын үзүүлэлтийг суралцах хоёр дахь архитектур болгон бүтээж байна. ChainCQG нь хариулт мэдэхгүй болон хариулт мэдэхгүй SOTA суурь шулуунууд хоёулаа чухал үр дүнтэй байдаг. Мөн бидний загвар нь өөр төрлийн асуултуудыг бий болгодог.', 'sv': 'Samtalssystem möjliggör många värdefulla tillämpningar, och frågesvar är en viktig komponent bakom många av dessa. Det är dock fortfarande svårt att besvara konversationsfrågor på grund av bristen på realistiska, domänspecifika träningsdata. Inspirerad av denna flaskhals fokuserar vi på konversationsfrågor som ett sätt att generera syntetiska samtal för utbildning och utvärdering. Vi presenterar ett antal nya strategier för att förbättra konversationsflödet och tillgodose olika frågetyper och övergripande fluiditet. Specifikt utformar vi ChainCQG som en tvåstegs arkitektur som lär sig frågor-svar representationer över flera dialogsvängar med hjälp av en flödespredningsstrategi. ChainCQG överträffar avsevärt både svarsmedvetna och svarsmedvetna SOTA-baslinjer (t.ex. upp till 48% BLEU-1 förbättring). Dessutom kan vår modell generera olika typer av frågor, med förbättrad fluiditet och coreference justering.', 'so': "Isticmaalka talobixiyayaashu waxay awoodaan codsiyo badan oo qiimo leh, jawaabta su'aaluna waa qayb muhiim ah oo ka hooseeya qaarkood. Si kastaba ha ahaatee jawaabta su'aalaha la hadlo waxay ku jirtaa dhibaato la xiriira baahida macluumaadka waxbarashada ee dhabta ah ee gudaha. Wax laguugu soo dhiibay baalkan, waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa qarniga su'aalaha la hadlo, taas oo ah qaab aan u sameyno hadal isbitaal ah oo loogu talo galay waxbarashada iyo qiimeynta. Waxaannu soo bandhignaa qoraalo badan oo saxda ah si aan u hagaajino safarka hadalka iyo in aan u soo degno noocyo kala duduwan iyo faa'iido dhamaan. Si gaar ah, waxaynu ChainCQG u qoraynaa dhismo labaad, kaas oo barta noocyada jawaabta jawaabta oo ku qoran dialog kala duduwan ku leedahay isticmaalka qorshaha waxbarashada safarka. ChainCQG wuxuu si weyn u muujiyaa jawaab-aware iyo jawaab-aan-ogayn SOTA-baseline (tusaale, up to 48% BLEU-1 improvement). Sidoo kale modellkayagu wuxuu sameyn karaa su'aalo kala duduwan, wuxuuna ku sameyn karaa bedelka faa'iidada iyo isbedelka.", 'ta': 'பேச்சு அமைப்புகள் பல மதிப்புள்ள பயன்பாடுகளை செயல்படுத்துகிறது, மற்றும் கேள்வி பதில் கேட்கையின் முக்கியமான பொரு ஆனால், பேசும் கேள்வி பதில் இருக்கும் வெளிப்படையான, குறிப்பிட்ட பயிற்சி தகவல் குறைவான காரணத்தால் விரல்கள இந்த குப்பாட்டின்க் ஆச்சரியப்படுத்தப்பட்டது, நாம் பேச்சு கேள்வி தலைமுறையில் கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம் ஒரு வழி பேச்சு நடவடிக்கையை மேம்படுத்த பல புதிய திட்டங்களை நாம் கொண்டுள்ளோம் மற்றும் வித்தியாசமான கேள்வி வகைகள் மற்றும குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் சேன்சிகியூஜியை இரண்டு நிலையில் கட்டமைப்பாட்டாக வடிவமைக்கிறோம். அது கேள்வி பதில் குறிப்பிடுகளை கற்று பல உரையா ChainCQG முக்கியமாக பதில்- aware மற்றும் பதில் தெரியாத SOTA அடிப்படைகளை வெளியேற்றுகிறது (உ. ம், 48% BLEU- 1 முன்னேற்றத்திற்கு மேல்). கூடுதலாக, எங்கள் மாதிரி வேறு வகையான கேள்விகளை உருவாக்க முடியும், மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட துள்ளியை மற்றும் குறிப்பு ஒழ', 'ur': 'مکالمانی سیسٹم بہت سی ارزش کاربریاں کو فعال کرتا ہے، اور سوال جواب دینے کا ایک اہم کامپیوتر ہے ان میں سے بہت سی باتوں کے نیچے۔ However, conversational question-answer remains challenging due to the lack of real, domain-specific training data. اس بٹلہرک کے ذریعے ہمیں تدبیر اور ارزیابی کے مطابق سینٹیٹیکی باتیں پیدا کرنے کے لئے مطابق بنانے کے ذریعے تدبیر سوال کی نسل پر تمرکز کیا گیا ہے. ہم نے بہت سی نئی استراتژی پیش کیے ہیں جو مکالمانوں کی جریان بہتر کریں اور مختلف سؤال کے طریقے اور کل مائل کے ساتھ آرام کریں۔ خاص طور پر، ہم ChainCQG کو ایک دومرحلہ معماری بنا کر طراحی کر رہے ہیں جو سوال-جواب کی تعلیمات کی تعلیمات کو بہت سی ڈالیلوگو میں پھیر رہے ہیں ایک فلوپ پراپاژن ترین ترین استراتژی کے مطابق۔ ChainCQG بہت اچھی طرح جواب دینے والی اور جواب-غیر جاننے والی SOTA بنسٹ لینٹ (جیسے 48% زیادہ BLEU-1 سوچنے پر) اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ اور اضافہ، ہماری مدل مختلف سوال کے جوڑے پیدا کر سکتا ہے، بہترین سیدھی اور مہربانی سیدھائی کے ساتھ.', 'uz': "Conversational systems enable numerous valuable applications, and question-answering is an important component underlying many of these.  Lekin, muloqat savol javob berishi haqiqiqiy, domen-muhit taʼminlovchi maʼlumot yoʻq sababda davom etishdir. Bu kichkina tomonidan imzolangan, biz talab qilish va qiymatni qanday qilish uchun munosabatlarni foydalanishimiz mumkin. Biz bir necha qancha novel strategiyalarini yaxshi ko'proq suhbat orqali o'zgartirish va har hil savol turlarini va umumiy suhbatni qo'shish uchun ko'plab yuboramiz. Ko'pchilik, biz ChainCQG tashkilotni ikki darajada yaratishimiz va bir necha muloqat oynalarda savol representlarini o'rganadi va flow propaganda taʼminlovchi strategiya yordamida o'rganamiz. ChainCQG haqida javob beruvchi va javob nomaʼlum SOTA asosiy satrlarini bajaradi (m. g. 48% BLEU- 1 taʼminlovchi). Qo'shimcha, bizning modelmiz turli savollarni yaratishi mumkin, soʻzlik va chegaralik bilan yaxshi ko'ra oladi.", 'vi': "Hệ thống đối thoại cho phép nhiều ứng dụng có giá trị, và câu trả lời là một yếu tố quan trọng ẩn chứa nhiều thứ. Tuy nhiên, câu trả lời câu hỏi đối thoại vẫn còn khó khăn vì thiếu dữ liệu giáo huấn thực tế, cụ thể miền. Nguồn cảm hứng từ nút chai này, chúng tôi tập trung vào việc chuyển câu hỏi để tạo ra cuộc đối thoại nhân tạo cho mục đích huấn luyện và đánh giá. Chúng tôi đưa ra một số chiến lược mới để cải thiện dòng chảy đối thoại và thích ứng các kiểu câu hỏi khác nhau và độ lỏng tổng thể. Về cụ thể, chúng tôi thiết kế ChainsCG như một kiến trúc hai giai đoạn học các đáp hỏi xuyên qua nhiều cuộc đối thoại, sử dụng một chiến lược đào tạo dòng chảy. ChainCQG hoàn thiện tối đa cả hệ thống thông tin và hệ thống nền SOTA không biết (v.v. d., đến 48='lgelu-1) cải tiến. Hơn nữa, mẫu của chúng tôi có khả năng tạo ra các loại câu hỏi khác nhau, với sự bổ sung nhanh và khả năng hạn chế.", 'da': 'Samtalesystemer muliggør mange værdifulde applikationer, og spørgsmål besvarelse er en vigtig komponent bag mange af disse. Samtalende spørgsmål er dog stadig udfordrende på grund af manglen på realistiske, domænespecifikke træningsdata. Inspireret af denne flaskehalse fokuserer vi på samtalespørgsmålstegnelse som et middel til at generere syntetiske samtaler til trænings- og evalueringsformål. Vi præsenterer en række nye strategier til at forbedre samtaleflow og imødekomme forskellige spørgsmål typer og overordnet flydende. Specielt designer vi ChainCQG som en to-trins arkitektur, der lærer spørgsmål-svar repræsentationer på tværs af flere dialogsving ved hjælp af en flow propagation træningsstrategi. ChainCQG overgår betydeligt både svarbevidste og svaruvidende SOTA basislinjer (f.eks. op til 48% BLEU-1 forbedring). Desuden er vores model i stand til at generere forskellige typer spørgsmål, med forbedret fluiditet og coreference justering.', 'bg': 'Разговорните системи позволяват многобройни ценни приложения и отговорът на въпроси е важен компонент в основата на много от тях. Обаче разговорният отговор на въпроси остава предизвикателство поради липсата на реалистични, специфични за областта данни за обучение. Вдъхновени от това затруднение, ние се фокусираме върху генерирането на разговорни въпроси като средство за генериране на синтетични разговори за целите на обучението и оценката. Представяме редица нови стратегии за подобряване на разговорния поток и адаптиране на различни типове въпроси и цялостна плавност. По-конкретно, ние проектираме като двуетапна архитектура, която изучава представяне на въпроси-отговори през множество диалогови завои, използвайки стратегия за обучение за разпространение на потока. ChainCQG значително превъзхожда както базовите линии на SOTA, така и на несъзнателните (напр. до 48% подобрение). Освен това нашият модел е в състояние да генерира различни типове въпроси, с подобрена плавност и подравняване на кореференцията.', 'hr': 'Razgovorni sustavi omogućavaju brojne vrijedne aplikacije, a odgovor na pitanje je važan komponent pod mnogim od njih. Međutim, razgovorni odgovor na pitanje i dalje je izazovan zbog nedostatka realnih podataka o obuci na domenu. Inspirirali smo se na generaciju konvercionalnih pitanja kao sredstvo za stvaranje sintetičkih razgovora za svrhe obuke i procjene. Predstavljamo broj novih strategija za poboljšanje razgovornog toka i usmjerenje različitih vrsta pitanja i ukupne tekućine. Posebno, mi dizajniramo ChainCQG kao dvofaznu arhitekturu koja uči zastupanje odgovora na pitanje u višestrukom dijalogu koristeći strategiju za obuku proširenja toka. ChainCQG značajno iznosi i osnovne linije SOTA-a bez odgovora (npr. poboljšanje BLEU-1 do 48 posto). Osim toga, naš model je u mogućnosti stvoriti različite vrste pitanja, uz poboljšanje tekućine i pristojnosti.', 'nl': 'Gesprekssystemen maken tal van waardevolle toepassingen mogelijk, en het beantwoorden van vragen is een belangrijk onderdeel van veel daarvan. Gespreksvragen beantwoorden blijft echter uitdagend vanwege het ontbreken van realistische, domeinspecifieke trainingsgegevens. Geïnspireerd door deze knelpunten, richten we ons op conversatievraaggeneratie als middel om synthetische gesprekken te genereren voor training- en evaluatiedoeleinden. We presenteren een aantal nieuwe strategieën om de gespreksstroom te verbeteren en rekening te houden met verschillende vraagtypen en algehele vloeibaarheid. Specifiek ontwerpen we ChainCQG als een tweetraps architectuur die vraag-antwoord representaties leert over meerdere dialogbeurten met behulp van een flow propagation trainingsstrategie. ChainCQG presteert aanzienlijk beter dan antwoord-bewuste en antwoord-onbewuste SOTA basislijnen (bijv. tot 48% BLEU-1 verbetering). Daarnaast is ons model in staat om verschillende soorten vragen te genereren, met verbeterde vloeibaarheid en coreferentie uitlijning.', 'id': 'Sistem konversasi memungkinkan banyak aplikasi berharga, dan jawaban pertanyaan adalah komponen penting yang mendasarkan banyak dari ini. Namun, jawaban pertanyaan percakapan tetap menantang karena kekurangan data latihan secara realistis, spesifik domain. Inspired by this bottleneck, we focus on conversational question generation as a means to generate synthetic conversations for training and evaluation purposes.  Kami mempersembahkan beberapa strategi baru untuk meningkatkan aliran konversasi dan mengakomodasi berbagai jenis pertanyaan dan keseluruhan cairan. Secara spesifik, kita merancang ChainCQG sebagai arsitektur dua tahap yang mempelajari persembahan pertanyaan-jawaban melalui berbagai dialog berubah menggunakan strategi latihan aliran. ChainCQG secara signifikan melebihi garis dasar SOTA yang menyadari jawaban dan tidak menyadari jawaban (contohnya, sampai 48% peningkatan BLEU-1). Selain itu, model kita mampu menghasilkan jenis pertanyaan yang berbeda, dengan peningkatan fluidity dan kesesuaian koreferens.', 'de': 'Gesprächssysteme ermöglichen zahlreiche wertvolle Anwendungen, und die Beantwortung von Fragen ist ein wichtiger Baustein, der vielen zugrunde liegt. Aufgrund des Mangels an realistischen, domänenspezifischen Trainingsdaten bleibt die Beantwortung konversativer Fragen jedoch eine Herausforderung. Inspiriert von diesem Engpass konzentrieren wir uns auf die Generierung von Gesprächsfragen als Mittel zur Generierung synthetischer Konversationen für Trainings- und Evaluationszwecke. Wir stellen eine Reihe neuer Strategien vor, um den Gesprächsfluss zu verbessern und unterschiedliche Fragetypen und die allgemeine Fluidität zu berücksichtigen. Insbesondere entwerfen wir ChainCQG als zweistufige Architektur, die Frage-Antwort-Darstellungen über mehrere Dialogdrehungen hinweg lernt und eine Flow-Propagation-Trainingsstrategie verwendet. ChainCQG übertrifft sowohl Antwort-bewusste als auch Antwort-unbewusste SOTA-Baselines signifikant (z.B. bis zu 48% BLEU-1 Verbesserung). Darüber hinaus ist unser Modell in der Lage, verschiedene Arten von Fragen zu generieren, mit verbesserter Fluidität und Coreferenz Alignment.', 'fa': 'سیستم\u200cهای گفتگو برای کاربردهای بسیاری ارزشمند فعال می\u200cکند، و جواب سوال\u200cها یک بخش مهمی است که بسیاری از این\u200cها را پایین می\u200cدهد. ولی جواب سوال مکالمانی به دلیل lack of real, domain-specific training data remains challenging. توسط این بطری، ما روی نسل سوال مکالمه تمرکز می کنیم به عنوان یک وسیله برای تولید مکالمه\u200cهای سینتیک برای هدف آموزش و ارزیابی. ما تعدادی از استراتژی\u200cهای نو را برای بهبود جریان مکالمه\u200cها و تنظیم نوع\u200cهای مختلف سوال و کل مایع را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. مخصوصاً ما ChainCQG را به عنوان یک معماری دو مرحله طراحی می کنیم که از طریق استراتژی آموزش جاری پرسیدن و جواب سوال یاد می گیرد. ChainCQG به طور کلی از خطوط پایگاه SOTA (مثلاً تا 48 درصد بهترین توسعه BLEU-1) به پاسخ و پاسخ غیر آگاهی انجام می\u200cدهد. به اضافه، مدل ما قادر است که نوع سوال مختلف را تولید کند، با تطبیق مایع و تطبیق رضایت بیشتر.', 'ko': '대화 시스템은 많은 가치 있는 응용을 실현할 수 있지만 문답은 그 중에서 많은 응용의 중요한 구성 부분이다.그러나 현실적이고 특정 분야의 교육 데이터가 부족하기 때문에 회화식 문답은 여전히 도전적이다.이 병목의 계발을 받아 우리는 회화 문제의 생성에 중점을 두고 교육과 평가 목적에 사용되는 합성 회화를 생성하는 수단으로 삼을 것이다.우리는 회화 흐름을 개선하고 서로 다른 문제 유형과 전체적인 유동성에 적응하기 위해 새로운 전략을 제시했다.구체적으로 우리는 ChainCQG를 2단계 구조로 설계하여 흐름 전파 훈련 전략을 사용하고 여러 대화 라운드에서 문제-답안 표시를 배울 것이다.ChainCQG는 응답 감지와 응답 불감지 SOTA 기선(예를 들어 BLEU-1 개선은 48%)보다 현저히 우수하다.그 밖에 우리 모델은 서로 다른 유형의 문제를 생성할 수 있고 더욱 좋은 유동성과 공지 정렬을 가진다.', 'sw': 'Mifumo ya mazungumzo inawezesha matumizi mengi ya thamani, na majibu ya maswali ni sehemu muhimu yenye baadhi ya haya. Hata hivyo, majibu ya maswali ya mazungumzo yanabaki kuwa na changamoto kutokana na ukosefu wa taarifa za mafunzo halisi, mahsusi ya ndani. Kuhamishwa na chupa hii, tunajikita kwenye kizazi cha maswali ya mazungumzo kama njia ya kutengeneza mazungumzo ya pamoja kwa ajili ya mafunzo na uchunguzi. We present a number of novel strategies to improve conversational flow and accommodate varying question types and overall fluidity.  Kwa hakika, tunaunda ChainCQG kama ujenzi wa jukwaa mbili ambalo linajifunza wawakilishi wa maswali katika mazungumzo mbalimbali hugeuka kwa kutumia mkakati wa mafunzo ya mafunzo ya kusambaza. ChainCQG inaonyesha vizuri vya majibu yenye ufahamu na misingi ya SOTA isiyofahamika (mfano, hadi asilimia 48 ya BLEU-1). Zaidi ya hayo, muundo wetu unaweza kutengeneza aina mbalimbali za maswali, kwa kuongezeka kwa ujasiri na usawa wa msingi.', 'tr': "Qonuşma sistemleri birnäçe mykdarly ukyplary mümkin edýär, we sorag jogaplary bu köpüň altynda möhüm bir komponentdir. Ýöne, taryşma soraglaryň jogapy realistik, domena spesifik eğitim maglumatlarynyň ýok bolmagynyň sebäbi kynçylykly dur. Bu boýunçylyk tarapyndan örän möhüm bolan, okuw we çykyş amaçlary üçin syntetik gürrüňleri döretmek üçin umytlaryň döredilmesine üns berýäris. Biz çykyş aklanyny geliştirmek üçin birnäçe taýýarlar we üýtgeşik soraglaryň türlerini we ähli süýtgeşik bilen birleştirmek üçin taýýarlapdyk. Adatça, biz ChainCQG'y iki stadij arhitektura öwrenýän sorag-jogabat temsillerini birnäçe dijalogda aklanma okuwçylygy strategiýasy ullanýarys. ChainCQG hem jogabaty bilen tanyşyp biljek hem jogabaty bilen tanyşyp bilmeýän SOTA üssgelerini (meselâ, 48% BLEU-1 gelişmelerine çenli). Ayrıca, modelimiz farklı bir şekilde soraglary geliştirebilir. Işiklilik we yönelik çözümlerini geliştirmek biler.", 'sq': 'Sistemet konversacionale mundësojnë aplikime të shumta të vlefshme dhe përgjigja e pyetjeve është një përbërës e rëndësishme në bazë të shumë prej tyre. Megjithatë, përgjigjet bisedimore për pyetje mbeten sfiduese për shkak të mungesës së të dhënave realiste dhe të trajnimit specifik për fushën. Inspiruar nga kjo pengesë, ne përqëndrohemi në gjenerimin e pyetjeve bisedimore si një mjet për të gjeneruar bisedime sintetike për qëllime treinimi dhe vlerësimi. Ne paraqesim një numër strategjish të reja për të përmirësuar rrjedhjen e bisedimeve dhe për të përshtatur llojet e ndryshme të pyetjeve dhe fluiditetin e përgjithshëm. Veçanërisht, ne dizajnojmë ChainCQG si një arkitekturë dy-fazore që mëson përfaqësime pyetjeje-përgjigje nëpërmjet dialogut të shumëfishtë kthehet duke përdorur një strategji trajnimi për përhapjen e rrjedhjes. ChainCQG tejkalon në mënyrë të konsiderueshme linjat bazë të SOTA-së që janë të ndërgjegjshme për përgjigje dhe jo të ndërgjegjshme për përgjigje (për shembull deri në 48% përmirësim BLEU-1). Përveç kësaj, modeli ynë është në gjendje të gjenerojë lloje të ndryshme pyetjesh, me përmirësim të fluiditetit dhe përputhje korreference.', 'af': "Gespraakte stelsels aktiveer veelvuldige waarde toepassings, en vraag-antwoord is 'n belangrike komponent ondersteun baie van hierdie. Maar, omskakelike vraag-antwoord bly aangelyk vanweë die ontbreek van realistiese, domein-spesifieke onderwerking data. Inspirasie deur hierdie botnek, fokus ons op omskakelike vraag genereering as 'n betekening om sintetiese gesprekke te genereer vir onderwerp en evaluering doels. Ons stel 'n aantal nuwe strategies om verskillende vloei te verbeter en verskillende vraagtipes en heeltemal fluiditeit te hou. Spesifieke, ons ontwerp ChainCQG as 'n twee-stadige arkitektuur wat leer vraag-antwoord verteenwoordes oor veelvuldige dialoog draai met 'n vloei propagasie-onderwerking strategie. ChainCQG betekeurig uitvoer beide antwoord-bevestig en antwoord-onware SOTA-basisline (bv. tot 48 % BLEU-1 verbetering). In addition, our model is able to generate different types of questions, with improved fluidity and coreference alignment.", 'am': 'የአካባቢ ስርዓቶች ብዙዎችን የሚከበሩ ፕሮግራሞች ያስችላል፡፡ However, conversational question-answering remains challenging due to the lack of realistic, domain-specific training data.  በዚህ አቁማዳዊ ጥያቄ በመፍጠር፣ የንግግር ጥያቄ ትውልድ ለትምህርት እና ለማስተማርና ለመፍጠር ማድረግ ማድረግ እናስማራለን፡፡ የአንዳንድ የረኀብ ዘጠኝነት እና የተለያዩ ጥያቄዎችን እና የሙሉ ጥያቄዎችን ለማሻሻል እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ የቻንCQG የሁለት ደረጃ መሠረት መሠረት እንደምናስተምር የጥያቄ መልስ መልዕክቶችን በብዙ አካባቢ እናስተምረዋለን፡፡ ChainCQG በኩል መልስ-ማስታወቂያ እና መልስ-ያልታወቀ የSOTA መደገፊያዎች (ምሳሌ፣ እስከ 48% BLEU-1 ማሻሻሻል) በተጨማሪም ሞዴል ልዩ ዓይነት ጥያቄዎችን መፍጠር ይችላል፣ በጥያቄ እና በክፍለ ግንኙነት ማቀናቀል ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': "Հաշխատային համակարգերը հնարավորություն են տալիս բազմաթիվ արժեքավոր ծրագրեր, և հարցերի պատասխանը նրանցից շատերին հիմնական կարևոր բաղադրիչ է: However, conversational question-answering remains challenging due to the lack of realistic, domain-specific training data.  Հոգեշնչված այս խեղճից, մենք կենտրոնանում ենք խոսակցության հարցերի ստեղծման վրա, որպես միջոց ստեղծելու սինթետիկ խոսակցություններ ուսուցման և գնահատման նպատակների համար: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի շարք նոր ռազմավարություններ խոսակցության հոսքի բարելավման և հարցերի տարբեր տեսակներ և ընդհանուր հեղություն ընդունելու համար: Հատկապես, մենք նախագծում ենք Chain CQG-ը որպես երկու փուլում կառուցվածք, որն ուսումնասիրում է հարցերի և պատասխանների ներկայացումներ բազմաթիվ շրջաններում, օգտագործելով հոսանքի տարածման աստեգիա: Chain CQG-ը նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում է պատասխաններով գիտակցած և պատասխաններով անգիտակցած SOTOA հիմնական գծերը (օրինակ, մինչև 48 տոկոս բլեւ-1 բարելավում): Ավելին, մեր մոդելը կարողանում է ստեղծել տարբեր տեսակի հարցեր' բարելավելով հեղությունը և հարաբերությունները:", 'bn': 'কথোপকথন সিস্টেম অনেক মূল্যবান অ্যাপলিকেশন সক্রিয় করে এবং প্রশ্নের উত্তর অনেকের ভিতরে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ অংশ। তবে বাস্তবতা, ডোমেইন-নির্দিষ্ট প্রশিক্ষণের অভাবের কারণে আলোচনা প্রশ্নের উত্তর চ্যালেঞ্জ এখনো চ্যালেঞ্জ করছে। এই বোতলেন্সেকের দ্বারা অনুপ্রাণিত হয়েছে, আমরা আলোচনার প্রজন্মের উপর মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি যেটা প্রশিক্ষণ ও মূল্যায়নের উদ্দেশ্যে সিন্টে কথোপকথনের প্রবাহ উন্নতি এবং বিভিন্ন প্রশ্নের ধরন এবং সাধারণ প্রশ্নের সাথে স্থানান্তর করার জন্য আমরা বেশ কিছু উপস্থাপন করি। বিশেষ করে, আমরা চেইনসিকিউজিকে দুই মাত্রা স্থাপন হিসেবে ডিজাইন করি যা প্রশ্ন-উত্তরের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখে বেশ কয়েকটি ডায়ালগের প্রশ্নের প চেইনসিকিউজি উভয় উত্তর-সচেতনতা এবং উত্তর-অজানা সোটার বেসাইনসেলাইন (উদাহরণস্বরূপ ৪৮% বেলিউ-১ উন্নয়ন)। এছাড়াও, আমাদের মডেল বিভিন্ন ধরনের প্রশ্ন তৈরি করতে পারে, যার ফলে ফ্লুইডিটি এবং কোরিফেন্সের সাথে উন্নত করা হয়।', 'az': "Qonuşma sistemləri çox qiymətli proqramları fəallaşdırır, və sual cavab vermək bunların çoxunun altında möhüm komponentdir. Lakin, müzakirə sual cavab vermək hələ də reālistik, domain-specific təhsil məlumatı yoxdur. Bu çətinliklə təşkil edilmişdir, təhsil və değerlendirmə məqsədilə sintetik danışmalar yaratmaq üçün müvəffəqiyyətli sual nəslinə təsirlik edirik. Biz bir neçə yeni strateji göstəririk ki, danışmaq akışını yaxşılaşdırmaq və müxtəlif sual növlərini və bütün sıxınlıqları ilə istifadə etmək üçün. Biz ChainCQG'i çoxlu dijalog üzərində sual-cavab təsirlərini öyrənən iki səbəb arhitektura kimi dizayn edirik. ChainCQG həm cavab-xəbərsiz, həm də cavab-xəbərsiz SOTA səhifələrini çox böyük g östərir. Əksinə, modellərimiz müxtəlif suallar yaratmağa qadirdir.", 'bs': 'Razgovorni sistemi omogućavaju brojne vrijedne aplikacije, a odgovor na pitanje je važan komponent pod mnogim od njih. Međutim, razgovorni odgovor na pitanje i dalje je izazovan zbog nedostatka realnih podataka o obuci na domenu. Inspirirani od ovog slabića, fokusiramo se na generaciju konverzacionog pitanja kao sredstvo za stvaranje sintetičkih razgovora za ciljeve obuke i procjene. Predstavljamo broj novih strategija za poboljšanje razgovornog toka i usmjerenje različitih vrsta pitanja i ukupne tekućine. Posebno, mi dizajniramo ChainCQG kao dvofaznu arhitekturu koja uči zastupanje odgovora na pitanje u višestrukom dijalogu koristeći strategiju propagacije toka. ChainCQG značajno iznosi i osnovne linije SOTA-a bez odgovora i odgovora (npr. poboljšanje BLEU-1 do 48%. Osim toga, naš model je u stanju da stvori različite vrste pitanja, sa poboljšanom tekućinom i usklađivanjem pristojnosti.', 'cs': 'Konverzační systémy umožňují mnoho cenných aplikací a odpověď na otázky je důležitou součástí mnoha z nich. Konverzační odpověď na otázky však zůstává náročná kvůli nedostatku realistických, doménově specifických tréninkových dat. Inspirováni tímto úzkým místem se zaměřujeme na generování konverzačních otázek jako prostředek k generování syntetických konverzací pro účely školení a hodnocení. Představujeme řadu nových strategií pro zlepšení konverzačního toku a vyhovění různým typům otázek a celkové plynulosti. Konkrétně navrhujeme ChainCQG jako dvoustupňovou architekturu, která se učí reprezentace otázek a odpovědí napříč několika dialogovými otáčkami pomocí strategie šíření toku. ChainCQG výrazně překonává základní linie SOTA, které si uvědomují odpověď i nevědomí odpovědi (např. zlepšení až 48% BLEU-1). Navíc je náš model schopen generovat různé typy otázek, se zlepšenou plynulostí a koreferenčním zarovnáním.', 'et': 'Vestlussüsteemid võimaldavad arvukalt väärtuslikke rakendusi ja küsimustele vastamine on paljude nende aluseks oluline komponent. Siiski on vestlusküsimustele vastamine jätkuvalt keeruline, kuna puuduvad realistlikud valdkonnapõhised koolitusandmed. Sellest kitsaskohast inspireerituna keskendume vestlusküsimuste tekitamisele, et luua sünteetilisi vestlusi koolituse ja hindamise eesmärgil. Esitleme mitmeid uudseid strateegiaid, et parandada vestlusvoogu ja vastata erinevatele küsimustele ja üldisele sujuvusele. Konkreetselt kujundame ChainCQG kaheastmelise arhitektuurina, mis õpib küsimuste-vastuste esitusi mitme dialoogipöörde jooksul, kasutades voogude leviku koolitusstrateegiat. ChainCQG ületab märkimisväärselt nii vastusteadlikke kui ka mitteteadlikke SOTA lähtejooni (nt kuni 48% BLEU-1 paranemine). Lisaks on meie mudel võimeline tekitama erinevat tüüpi küsimusi, parandades voolavust ja põhiviidet.', 'ca': "Els sistemes conversacionals permeten moltes aplicacions valioses, i respondre a preguntes és un component important subjacent a moltes d'elles. However, conversational question-answering remains challenging due to the lack of realistic, domain-specific training data.  Inspirats per aquest bloc d'ampolla, ens centrem en la generació de preguntes conversacionals com a mitjà per generar converses sintètiques a propòsit d'entrenament i evaluació. Presentam una sèrie d'estratègies noves per millorar el flux conversacional i acomodar diferents tipus de preguntes i fluiditat global. Concretament, dissenyem ChainCQG com una arquitectura de dos etapes que aprenen representacions de preguntes-respostes a través de múltiples girs de diàleg fent servir una estratègia de capacitació de propagació de flux. ChainCQG supera significativament les línies de base SOTA conscients de la resposta i no conscients de la resposta (per exemple, fins al 48% de millora BLEU-1). A més, el nostre model és capaç de generar diferents tipus de preguntes, amb una millor fluiditat i alliniament de coreferència.", 'fi': 'Keskustelujärjestelmät mahdollistavat lukuisia arvokkaita sovelluksia, ja kysymyksiin vastaaminen on tärkeä osa monia niistä. Keskusteluun vastaaminen on kuitenkin edelleen haastavaa, koska realistisia, alakohtaisia koulutustietoja ei ole. Tämän pullonkaulan innoittamana keskitymme keskustelukysymysten tuottamiseen keinona luoda synteettisiä keskusteluja koulutus- ja arviointitarkoituksiin. Esittelemme useita uusia strategioita keskustelun sujuvuuden parantamiseksi ja erilaisten kysymysten ja yleisen sujuvuuden huomioon ottamiseksi. Suunnittelemme ChainCQG:n kaksivaiheiseksi arkkitehtuuriksi, joka oppii kysymys-vastaus-esityksiä useassa dialogin käänteessä käyttämällä virtauksen leviämisen koulutusstrategiaa. ChainCQG ylittää merkittävästi sekä vastaustietoisen että vastaustietämättömän SOTA-perusarvon (esim. jopa 48% BLEU-1-parannus). Lisäksi mallimme pystyy luomaan erilaisia kysymyksiä, joiden sulavuus ja koreferenssi ovat parantuneet.', 'jv': '1 politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive YAccelerator Awak dhéwé éntuk akèh sing pisan seneng pisan seneng pisan karo nggawe gerakan ingkang karo pakem nggawe barang seneng pisan lan ijol-ijolan sak koyok barang. CURRENTCURRENT, we design HeadnCqG mengko iso nglanggar sawong-awak lan nambah-awak dhéwé soko soko perusahaan soko nggunakake sing isin (bisa nambah 48%  luwih mlayu kanggo nggunakake CLUE-1). Mungkin, modelo sing bisa ngelarane perkara-perusahaan sing gak dadi, ngono langgar-perusahaan karo nggawe gerakan sing luwih dumadhan', 'sk': 'Pogovorni sistemi omogočajo številne dragocene aplikacije, odgovor na vprašanja pa je pomemben element, ki temelji na mnogih od teh. Vendar pa je pogovorno odgovarjanje na vprašanja še vedno zahtevno zaradi pomanjkanja realističnih podatkov o usposabljanju za posamezno področje. V navdihu s tem ozkim grlom se osredotočamo na ustvarjanje pogovornih vprašanj kot sredstvo za ustvarjanje sintetičnih pogovorov za namene usposabljanja in ocenjevanja. Predstavljamo številne nove strategije za izboljšanje pogovornega toka in sprejemanje različnih vrst vprašanj in splošne fluidnosti. Natančneje, ChainCQG oblikujemo kot dvostopenjsko arhitekturo, ki se uči predstavitev vprašanj-odgovorov v več obratih dialoga z uporabo strategije usposabljanja za širjenje toka. ChainCQG bistveno presega osnovne vrstice SOTA, ki se zavedajo odgovorov in ne zavedajo odgovorov (npr. do 48% izboljšanje BLEU-1). Poleg tega je naš model sposoben ustvariti različne vrste vprašanj z izboljšano tekočostjo in poravnavo koreference.', 'ha': "Systems na da mazaɓa masu amfani da shiryoyin ayuka masu inganci, kuma masu karɓa wa tambaya yana da wani abu mai muhimu wanda ke ƙaranci masu yawa daga wannan. A lokacin da ake karɓa wa tambayin da aka yi matayya, yana ƙaranci mai musamma, sabo da kuma bã ya da data na tsarin da aka ƙayyade guda. An yi wahayi da wannan flankki, tuna fokus a kan kiyãyen tambayar da ke yi magana kamar wata hanyor ya ƙãga wa'urar da mazaɓa na haɗiya zuwa ga wa'anar yin wa'anar da kuma ma'anar. Tuna gabatar da wasu takwai masu nowaya dõmin su improve tafiyar da mazaɓa da kuma mu sami wasu irin tambayar dabam-dabam da sami'a. Kayya, Munã ƙayyade ChainCQG kamar wani matsayi mai sauri biyu, wanda za'a sanar da masĩfi masu tambaya a cikin zauren zauren dabam-daban, yana yin amfani da wani takin mai tsari ga shirin bayani. ChainCQG significantly outperforms both jibu-mai-award and jawab-naƙasan SOTA base lines (misali, up to 48% BLEU-1 improvement). Da wannan, misalinmu yana iya iya iya ƙiƙiro nau'i-nau'i dabam-daban, da sauri na sauri, da sauri.", 'he': 'מערכות השיחה מאפשרות שימושים חשובים רבים, והעניין לשאלות הוא רכיב חשוב בסיס רבים מאלה. עם זאת, תשובות לשיחה נשארות מאתגרות בגלל חוסר נתוני אימונים מציאותיים, ספציפיים לתחום. בהשראה מהבקבוק הזה, אנחנו מתמקדים בדור שאלות שיחה כדרך לייצר שיחות סינטטיות למטרות אימון וערכה. אנחנו מציגים מספר אסטרטגיות חדשות כדי לשפר זרם שיחה ולהתאים סוגי שאלות שונים ונוזל כללי. במיוחד, אנחנו מעצבים את שרשרת CQG כארכיטקטורה בשתי שלבים שלמדה מייצגים שאלות-תשובות במהלך דיאלוג מרובה מסתובבים באמצעות אסטרטגיה אימון זרימות. שרשרת CQG מגבירה באופן משמעותי את קווי הבסיס של SOTA מודעים לתשובות ולא מודעים לתשובות (למשל עד 48% שיפור BLEU-1). בנוסף, המודל שלנו מסוגל ליצור סוגים שונים של שאלות, עם נוזל משופר ומתאים משותף.', 'bo': 'གཏམ་གླེང་ནུས་མ་ལག་གིས་རིན་ཐང་བའི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་རིགས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ནུས་ཡོད་བཟོས། དང་འདྲི་ཚིག ཡིན་ནའང་། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་དྲི་ཚིག་དང་གདོང་ལེན་བློ་གཏོང་ནི་དྲན་གཏོང་ཁག་པ་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་བློ་གཏོང་བཅུག་པ འུ་ཅག་གི་སྐུད་མེད་འདི་གིས་ནང ང་ཚོས་གཏམ་གླེང་གཏམ་གླེང་སྐྱོང་དང་། འདྲི་བ་དག་གི་རིགས་ཚང་མ་འདྲ་ཞིག་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་གཏོང དམིགས་བསལ་ན། ང་ཚོས་ChainCQG གཟུགས་རིས་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ལས་རྩལ་བ་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་དོན་ལ་ཤུགས་སྐབས་འདི་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་ནང་ག ChainCQG ཡིས་ལན་གསལ་བཤད་དང་གནད་སྡུད་མེད་པའི་SOTA་གཞི་རྟེན་འདི་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མང་ཙམ་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན།དཔེར་ན། BLEU-1་ཡར་རྒྱས ད་དུས་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་འདྲི་ཚིག་མི་འདྲ་བ་དང་མཐུན་རིམ་པ་སྒྲིག་གི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་ཐུབ།'}
{'en': 'The Interplay of Task Success and Dialogue Quality : An in-depth Evaluation in Task-Oriented Visual Dialogues', 'ar': 'التفاعل بين نجاح المهمة وجودة الحوار: تقييم متعمق في الحوارات المرئية الموجهة نحو المهام', 'pt': 'A interação entre o sucesso da tarefa e a qualidade do diálogo: uma avaliação aprofundada em diálogos visuais orientados a tarefas', 'es': 'La interacción del éxito de las tareas y la calidad del diálogo: una evaluación en profundidad de los diálogos visuales orientados a tareas', 'fr': "L'interaction entre la réussite des tâches et la qualité du dialogue\xa0: une évaluation approfondie dans les dialogues visuels axés sur les tâches", 'ja': 'タスクの成功と対話の質の相互作用：タスク指向の視覚的対話における詳細な評価', 'zh': '功成与对质,对面深相评', 'hi': 'कार्य सफलता और संवाद गुणवत्ता की परस्पर क्रिया: कार्य-उन्मुख दृश्य संवादों में एक गहन मूल्यांकन', 'ru': 'Взаимодействие успешного выполнения задач и качества диалога: углубленная оценка в визуальных диалогах, ориентированных на выполнение задач', 'ga': 'Idirghníomhú Ratha Tasc agus Cáilíocht Idirphlé: Measúnú domhain in Amharcchomhphlé atá Dírithe ar Thasc', 'hu': 'A feladat sikere és a párbeszédminőség kölcsönhatása: mélyreható értékelés a feladatorientált vizuális párbeszédekben', 'ka': 'დავალების წარმატების და დიალოგის კაvaliტიის ინტერპეგია: დავალებების განსაზღვრებული ვიზუალური დიალოგიების განსაზღვრება', 'el': 'Η αλληλεπίδραση της επιτυχίας των εργασιών και της ποιότητας του διαλόγου: Μια εμπεριστατωμένη αξιολόγηση σε οπτικούς διαλόγους προσανατολισμένους στην εργασία', 'it': "L'interazione tra successo delle attività e qualità del dialogo: una valutazione approfondita nei dialoghi visivi orientati alle attività", 'kk': 'Тапсырманың интерфейсі сәтті және диалогтың сапасы: Тапсырманың бағытталған көрінетін диалогтарының тереңдігін оқу', 'ms': 'Interplay Tugas Berjaya dan Kualiti Dialog: Penghargaan mendalam dalam Dialog Visual Berorientasi Tugas', 'lt': 'Užduočių sėkmės ir dialogo kokybės sąveika: nuodugnis vertinimas į užduotis orientuotuose vizualiniuose dialoguose', 'ml': 'The Interplay of Task Success and Dialogue Quality: An in-depth Evaluation in Task-Oriented Visual Dialogues', 'mt': 'L-Interazzjoni tas-Suċċess tal-Kompiti u l-Kwalità tad-Djalogu: Evalwazzjoni fil-fond fid-Djalogi Viżwali orjentati lejn il-Kompiti', 'mk': 'Интервјуацијата на успехот на задачите и квалитетот на дијалогот: длабока оценка во визуелните дијалози со задачи', 'mn': 'Тапсын амжилт болон диалогын чадварын интерпрей: Тапсын ориентиролт харагдах диалогуудын гүн гүнзгий үнэлгээ', 'pl': 'Współgra sukcesu zadań i jakości dialogu: dogłębna ocena w dialogach wizualnych zorientowanych na zadania', 'ro': 'Interjocul dintre succesul sarcinilor și calitatea dialogului: o evaluare aprofundată în dialogurile vizuale orientate spre sarcini', 'no': 'Grensesnittet på oppgåva suksess og dialogkvalitet: Eit i dybde evaluering i oppgåveorienterte visuelle dialogar', 'sr': 'Interigra uspeha zadataka i kvalitete dijaloga: duboka procjena u vizuelnim dijalogima s orijentacijom zadataka', 'ta': 'பணி வெற்றிகரம் மற்றும் உரையாடல் தரம்:', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Samspelet mellan uppgiftens framgång och dialogens kvalitet: En djupgående utvärdering i uppgiftsorienterade visuella dialoger', 'so': 'Isticmaalka shaqo iyo imtixaanka diyalogka: A in-depth evaluation in Tax-oriented Visual Dialog', 'ur': 'Task Success and Dialog Quality Interplay: A in-depth Evaluation in Task-Oriented Visual Dialogs', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Bài giải trình thành công và chất lượng đối thoại: Một bài đánh giá sâu sắc trong Hộp thoại hình thức hướng đặc nhiệm', 'bg': 'Взаимодействието на успеха на задачите и качеството на диалога: задълбочена оценка на визуалните диалози, ориентирани към задачите', 'da': 'Samspillet mellem opgavens succes og dialogens kvalitet: En dybdegående evaluering i opgaveorienterede visuelle dialoger', 'nl': 'Het samenspel van taakvolg en dialoogkwaliteit: een diepgaande evaluatie in taakgerichte visuele dialogen', 'hr': 'Intergraf uspjeha zadataka i kvalitete dijaloga: duboka procjena u vizuelnim dijalogima s orijentacijom zadataka', 'id': 'Interplay dari Sukses Tugas dan Kualitas Dialog: Evaluasi dalam Dialog Visual Berorientasi Tugas', 'de': 'Das Zusammenspiel von Aufgabenerfolg und Dialogqualität: Eine vertiefte Evaluation in aufgabenorientierten visuellen Dialogen', 'ko': '임무 성공과 대화의 질적 상호작용: 임무가 시각적 대화를 이끄는 깊이 있는 평가', 'fa': 'Interplay of Task Success and Dialog Quality: An deep Evaluation in Task-Oriented Visual Dialogs', 'tr': 'Görev üstünliki we dynç hilliki', 'sw': 'Mchezo wa mafanikio ya Kazi na Uwango wa Dialogu: Utafiti wa Kikina katika Dialogu za Mipango', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Ndërveprimi i suksesit të detyrës dhe cilësisë së dialogut: një vlerësim i thellë në dialogun vizual të orientuar në detyrë', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'az': 'İşlərin İşləşməsi və Dialoog Qıymeti: Görünüş-Oriqlı Görünür Dialooqlarında ən derin Qıymet', 'bs': 'Intergraf uspjeha zadataka i kvalitete dijaloga: duboka procjena u vizuelnim dijalogima s orijentacijom zadataka', 'hy': 'Գործի հաջողության և դասախոսության որակի ինտերֆեկցիան. Գործի ուղղությամբ տեսողական դասախոսություններում խորը գնահատում է', 'cs': 'Propojení úspěchu úkolů a kvality dialogu: hloubkové hodnocení vizuálních dialogů orientovaných na úkoly', 'et': 'Ülesande edu ja dialoogi kvaliteedi vastastikune mõju: ülesannetele orienteeritud visuaalsete dialoogide põhjalik hindamine', 'bn': 'The Interplay of Task Success and Dialogue Quality: An in-depth Evaluation in Task-Oriented Visual Dialogues', 'fi': 'Tehtävien onnistumisen ja vuoropuhelun laadun vuorovaikutus: perusteellinen arviointi tehtävälähtöisissä visuaalisissa vuoropuheluissa', 'ca': 'The Interplay of Task Success and Dialogue Quality: An in-depth Evaluation in Task-Oriented Visual Dialogues', 'jv': 'deep', 'sk': 'Medsebojna igra uspeha nalog in kakovosti dialoga: poglobljena ocena v vizualnih dialogih, usmerjenih v naloge', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་མཐར་འཁྱོལ་དང་སྒྲོམ་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་གྱི་རིམ་ཐང་ཚད：བྱ་འགུལ་ལ་མཐོང་ནུས་ཀྱི་མཐོང་སྣང་', 'he': 'המשחק של הצלחה במשימה ואיכות הדיולוגים: עריכה עמוקה בדיולוגים חזותיים ממוקמים במשימות'}
{'en': 'When training a model on referential dialogue guessing games, the best model is usually chosen based on its task success. We show that in the popular end-to-end approach, this choice prevents the model from learning to generate linguistically richer dialogues, since the acquisition of language proficiency takes longer than learning the guessing task. By comparing models playing different games (GuessWhat, GuessWhich, and Mutual Friends), we show that this discrepancy is model- and task-agnostic. We investigate whether and when better language quality could lead to higher task success. We show that in GuessWhat, models could increase their accuracy if they learn to ground, encode, and decode also words that do not occur frequently in the training set.', 'es': 'Cuando se entrena un modelo en juegos de adivinanzas de diálogo referencial, generalmente se elige el mejor modelo en función del éxito de su tarea. Demostramos que en el popular enfoque integral, esta elección impide que el modelo aprenda a generar diálogos lingüísticamente más ricos, ya que la adquisición del dominio del idioma lleva más tiempo que aprender la tarea de adivinar. Al comparar modelos que juegan a diferentes juegos (GuessWhat, GuessWhich y Mutual Friends), demostramos que esta discrepancia es independiente del modelo y la tarea. Investigamos si una mejor calidad del idioma podría conducir a un mayor éxito de las tareas y cuándo. Mostramos que en GuessWhat, los modelos podrían aumentar su precisión si aprenden a conectar a tierra, codificar y decodificar también palabras que no aparecen con frecuencia en el conjunto de entrenamiento.', 'ar': 'عند تدريب نموذج على ألعاب تخمين الحوار المرجعي ، يتم عادةً اختيار النموذج الأفضل بناءً على نجاح مهمته. نوضح أنه في النهج الشامل الشائع ، يمنع هذا الاختيار النموذج من التعلم لإنشاء حوارات أكثر ثراءً لغويًا ، نظرًا لأن اكتساب إتقان اللغة يستغرق وقتًا أطول من تعلم مهمة التخمين. من خلال مقارنة النماذج التي تلعب ألعابًا مختلفة (GuessWhat و GuessWhich و Mutual Friends) ، نظهر أن هذا التناقض لا يعتمد على النموذج والمهمة. نحن نتحرى ما إذا كانت جودة اللغة الأفضل تؤدي إلى نجاح المهام بشكل أكبر ومتى. نوضح أنه في GuessWhat ، يمكن للنماذج زيادة دقتها إذا تعلمت إنشاء الكلمات التي لا تحدث بشكل متكرر في مجموعة التدريب وترميزها وفك تشفيرها.', 'pt': 'Ao treinar um modelo em jogos de adivinhação de diálogo referencial, o melhor modelo geralmente é escolhido com base no sucesso da tarefa. Mostramos que na popular abordagem ponta a ponta, essa escolha impede que o modelo aprenda a gerar diálogos linguisticamente mais ricos, uma vez que a aquisição da proficiência linguística leva mais tempo do que aprender a tarefa de adivinhação. Ao comparar modelos que jogam jogos diferentes (GuessWhat, GuessWhich e Mutual Friends), mostramos que essa discrepância é independente de modelo e tarefa. Investigamos se e quando uma melhor qualidade de linguagem pode levar a um maior sucesso na tarefa. Mostramos que no GuessWhat, os modelos podem aumentar sua precisão se aprenderem a fundamentar, codificar e decodificar também palavras que não ocorrem com frequência no conjunto de treinamento.', 'fr': "Lors de l'entraînement d'un modèle sur des jeux de devinettes de dialogue référentiel, le meilleur modèle est généralement choisi en fonction de la réussite de sa tâche. Nous montrons que dans l'approche populaire de bout en bout, ce choix empêche le modèle d'apprendre à générer des dialogues plus riches sur le plan linguistique, car l'acquisition de compétences linguistiques prend plus de temps que l'apprentissage de la tâche de deviner. En comparant des modèles jouant à différents jeux (GuessWhat, GuessWhich et Mutual Friends), nous montrons que cet écart est indépendant du modèle et de la tâche. Nous cherchons à savoir si et quand une meilleure qualité linguistique peut améliorer la réussite des tâches. Nous montrons que dans GuessWhat, les modèles peuvent augmenter leur précision s'ils apprennent à mettre à la terre, à encoder et à décoder également des mots qui n'apparaissent pas fréquemment dans l'ensemble d'entraînement.", 'ja': '参照対話型推測ゲームのモデルをトレーニングする場合、最適なモデルは通常、そのタスクの成功に基づいて選択されます。私たちは、人気のあるエンドツーエンドのアプローチでは、言語能力の獲得には推測タスクの学習よりも時間がかかるため、この選択により、モデルが言語的に豊かな対話を生成することを学習することができないことを示しています。異なるゲームをプレイしているモデル（ GuessWhat、GuessWhich、およびMutual Friends ）を比較することで、この矛盾がモデルとタスクに依存しないことが示されます。私たちは、より良い言語品質がより高いタスクの成功につながる可能性があるかどうかを調査します。GuessWhatでは、モデルが訓練セットで頻繁に起こらない単語の接地、エンコード、デコードを学ぶと、精度が上がる可能性があることを示しています。', 'zh': '参以言猜谜戏,常以事成为最。 吾明流行之端,止于言多于言,得言能久于学也。 校戏之(GuessWhat,GuessWhich与Mutual Friends),明其异也。 论善言质,何时更高成功率。 吾于GuessWhat中明之,若模范学接地,编码与解码训练不常之单词,则可以崇其准确性。', 'hi': 'संदर्भित संवाद अनुमान लगाने वाले खेलों पर एक मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करते समय, सबसे अच्छा मॉडल आमतौर पर इसके कार्य की सफलता के आधार पर चुना जाता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि लोकप्रिय एंड-टू-एंड दृष्टिकोण में, यह विकल्प मॉडल को भाषाई रूप से समृद्ध संवाद उत्पन्न करने के लिए सीखने से रोकता है, क्योंकि भाषा प्रवीणता के अधिग्रहण में अनुमान लगाने के कार्य को सीखने से अधिक समय लगता है। विभिन्न गेम खेलने वाले मॉडलों की तुलना करके (GuessWhat, GuessWhich, और पारस्परिक मित्र), हम दिखाते हैं कि यह विसंगति मॉडल- और कार्य-अज्ञेयवादी है। हम जांच करते हैं कि क्या और जब बेहतर भाषा की गुणवत्ता उच्च कार्य सफलता का कारण बन सकती है। हम दिखाते हैं कि GuessWhat में, मॉडल अपनी सटीकता को बढ़ा सकते हैं यदि वे जमीन पर सीखते हैं, एन्कोड करते हैं, और उन शब्दों को भी डिकोड करते हैं जो प्रशिक्षण सेट में अक्सर नहीं होते हैं।', 'ru': 'При обучении модели на референтных диалоговых угадывающих играх, лучшая модель обычно выбирается исходя из успеха ее задачи. Мы показываем, что в популярном сквозном подходе этот выбор мешает модели учиться генерировать лингвистически более богатые диалоги, поскольку приобретение знания языка занимает больше времени, чем изучение угадывающей задачи. Сравнивая модели, играющие в разные игры (GuessWhat, GuessWhich и Mutual Friends), мы показываем, что это расхождение является модельным и диагностическим. Мы исследуем, может ли и когда более высокое качество языка привести к более высокому успеху задачи. Мы показываем, что в GuessWhat модели могут повысить свою точность, если они научатся заземлять, кодировать и декодировать также слова, которые не часто встречаются в обучающем наборе.', 'ga': 'Nuair a bhíonn múnla á oiliúint ar chluichí tomhais idirphlé tagartha, is gnách go roghnaítear an tsamhail is fearr bunaithe ar a rathúlacht sa tasc. Léirímid sa chur chuige coitianta ó cheann go ceann, go gcuireann an rogha seo cosc ar an tsamhail ó fhoghlaim chun idirphlé atá níos saibhre ó thaobh teanga a chruthú, mar go dtógann sé níos faide chun inniúlacht teanga a shealbhú ná an tasc tomhais a fhoghlaim. Trí shamhlacha a imríonn cluichí éagsúla a chur i gcomparáid (GuessWhat, GuessWhich, agus Frithpháirteach Cairde), léirímid go bhfuil an neamhréireacht seo eiseamláireach agus tasc-agnostic. Fiosróimid an bhféadfadh agus cén uair a d’fhéadfadh go n-éireodh le tascanna níos airde as cáilíocht teanga níos fearr. Léirímid i GuessWhat, go bhféadfadh samhlacha a gcruinneas a mhéadú má fhoghlaimíonn siad conas focail a thaisceadh, a ionchódú agus a dhíchódú nach dtarlaíonn go minic sa tacar oiliúna.', 'hu': 'Amikor egy referencia párbeszéd találgató játékokra vonatkozó modellt képeznek, a legjobb modellt általában a feladat sikere alapján választják ki. Megmutatjuk, hogy a népszerű end-to-end megközelítésben ez a választás megakadályozza, hogy a modell nyelvileg gazdagabb párbeszédeket hozzon létre, mivel a nyelvtudás megszerzése hosszabb ideig tart, mint a találgatási feladat megtanulása. A különböző játékokat játszó modellek (GuessWhat, GuessWhich és Közös Barátok) összehasonlításával megmutatjuk, hogy ez az eltérés modell- és feladat-agnosztikus. Megvizsgáljuk, hogy a jobb nyelvminőség mikor vezethet-e magasabb feladatsikerhez. Megmutatjuk, hogy a GuessWhat-ban a modellek növelhetik pontosságukat, ha megtanulják földelni, kódolni és dekódolni olyan szavakat is, amelyek nem fordulnak elő gyakran az edzőkészletben.', 'ka': 'როცა რეფერენციალური დიალოგის მოდულებაში მოდელის შემწყვება, საუკეთესო მოდელის შემდგომარეობაზე გამოიყენება. ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ პოლიპური საბოლოო დასრულებაში, ეს გამოყენება მოდელის მოწყობილობას უფრო დიალოგის შექმნა, რადგან ენის პროფიციენტის მიღება უფრო მეტი უფრო მეტი უფრო მეტი უნდა მოდელების შემდგომარებით განსხვავებული თამაში თამაშებით (GuessWhat, GuessWhich, და ერთმანეთი მეგობრებით) ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ეს განსხვავება ჩვენ განსხვავებთ თუ და როცა უკეთესი ენის კალიტურობა შეიძლება უფრო მეტი სამუშაო წარმატებისთვის. ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ მოდელები შეიძლება გავიზრდება მათი წარმოდგენებას, თუ ისინი სწავლებენ, კოდირებენ და კოდირებენ ასევე სიტყვები, რომელიც არ ხოლოდ მოხდებენ სტრიქ', 'el': 'Όταν εκπαιδεύετε ένα μοντέλο σε παιχνίδια μαντείας αναφορών διαλόγου, το καλύτερο μοντέλο επιλέγεται συνήθως με βάση την επιτυχία της εργασίας του. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι στη δημοφιλή προσέγγιση αυτή η επιλογή εμποδίζει το μοντέλο να μάθει να παράγει γλωσσικά πλουσιότερους διαλόγους, δεδομένου ότι η απόκτηση γλωσσικής επάρκειας διαρκεί περισσότερο από την εκμάθηση του έργου μαντείας. Συγκρίνοντας μοντέλα που παίζουν διαφορετικά παιχνίδια (και αμοιβαίοι φίλοι), δείχνουμε ότι αυτή η διαφορά είναι μοντέλο- και εργασία-agnostic. Ερευνούμε αν και πότε η καλύτερη ποιότητα της γλώσσας θα μπορούσε να οδηγήσει σε μεγαλύτερη επιτυχία εργασίας. Δείχνουμε ότι στο GuessWhat, τα μοντέλα θα μπορούσαν να αυξήσουν την ακρίβειά τους αν μάθουν να γειώνουν, να κωδικοποιούν και να αποκωδικοποιούν επίσης λέξεις που δεν εμφανίζονται συχνά στο εκπαιδευτικό σύνολο.', 'it': "Quando si allena un modello sui giochi di indovinatura del dialogo referenziale, il modello migliore viene solitamente scelto in base al suo successo. Dimostriamo che nell'approccio end-to-end popolare, questa scelta impedisce al modello di imparare a generare dialoghi linguisticamente più ricchi, poiché l'acquisizione di competenze linguistiche richiede più tempo che imparare il compito di indovinare. Confrontando modelli che giocano a giochi diversi (GuessWhat, GuessWhich e Mutual Friends), mostriamo che questa discrepanza è modello-e-compito-agnostica. Investighiamo se e quando una migliore qualità linguistica potrebbe portare a un maggiore successo dei compiti. Mostriamo che in GuessWhat, i modelli potrebbero aumentare la loro precisione se imparano a macinare, codificare e decodificare anche parole che non si verificano frequentemente nel set di allenamento.", 'kk': 'Референциялық диалог ойындарының үлгісін оқығанда, ең жақсы үлгісі әдетте тапсырманың сәттілігіне негізінде таңдалады. Біз мәліметті соңғы жағдайда, бұл таңдау үлгісін тіл профилитетінің алу үшін оқытуға арналған диалогтарды жасауға мүмкіндік береді, себебі тіл профилитетінің алу үшін таңдау тапсырмасын оқытуға Басқа ойындарды орындау үлгілерін салыстырып (GuessWhat, GuessWhich, және Mutual Friends) көрсету үлгісі - және тапсырма- agnostic деп көрсетеді. Біз тіл сапасы жоғары тапсырмалардың сәттілігін шешуге болады. Біз "GuessWhat" дегенді көрсету үлгілерінде, егер олар зерттеу, кодтау және оқыту бағдарламасында көбірек болмайтын сөздерді декодтау үшін оның дұрыстығын көтере алады.', 'mk': 'Кога се обучува модел за претпоставување на игрите во референцијалниот дијалог, најдобриот модел обично се избира врз основа на успехот на задачата. Ние покажуваме дека во популарниот пристап од крај до крај, овој избор го спречува моделот да научи да генерира јазички побогати дијалози, со оглед на тоа што добивањето на јазичката способност трае подолго отколку да ја научи задачата за претпоставување. Со споредба на моделите кои играат различни игри (GuessWhat, GuessWhich, и взаемни пријатели), покажуваме дека оваа дискрепанција е модел- и задачна-агностика. Истражуваме дали и кога подобар квалитет на јазикот може да доведе до поголем успех во задачата. Ние покажуваме дека во GuessWhat моделите би можеле да ја зголемат нивната точност ако научат да се приземјуваат, кодираат и декодираат, исто така, зборови кои не се случуваат често во сетот на тренинг.', 'ms': 'Apabila melatih model pada dialog referensi menebak permainan, model terbaik biasanya dipilih berdasarkan kesuksesan tugasnya. Kami menunjukkan bahawa dalam pendekatan akhir-akhir populer, pilihan ini mencegah model dari belajar untuk menghasilkan dialog yang lebih kaya secara bahasa, kerana pengakuan keterampilan bahasa mengambil lebih lama daripada belajar tugas menebak. Dengan membandingkan model bermain permainan yang berbeza (GuessWhat, GuessWhich, dan Mutual Friends), kami menunjukkan bahawa ketidakpadanan ini adalah model- dan tugas-agnostik. Kami menyelidiki sama ada dan bila kualiti bahasa yang lebih baik boleh menyebabkan kesuksesan tugas yang lebih tinggi. Kami menunjukkan bahawa dalam GuessWhat, model boleh meningkatkan ketepatan mereka jika mereka belajar untuk mendarat, mengekod, dan menyahkod juga perkataan yang tidak sering berlaku dalam set latihan.', 'mt': 'Meta jitħarreġ mudell dwar logħob ta’ tbassir ta’ djalogu referenzjali, l-a ħjar mudell normalment jintgħażel abbażi tas-suċċess tal-kompitu tiegħu. Aħna nuru li fl-approċċ popolari minn tarf sa tarf, din l-għażla tipprevjeni lill-mudell milli jitgħallem biex jiġġenera djalogi lingwistikament aktar rikki, peress li l-akkwist tal-kompetenza lingwistika jieħu aktar żmien milli jitgħallem il-kompitu ta’ tbassir. Billi nqabblu l-mudelli li jilagħbu logħob differenti (GuessWhat, GuessWhich, u Ħbieb Reċiproċi), nistgħu nuru li din id-diskrepanza hija mudell- u task-agnostic. Investigaw jekk u meta kwalità aħjar tal-lingwa tistax twassal għal suċċess akbar fil-kompiti. Aħna nuru li f’GuessWhat, il-mudelli jistgħu jżidu l-preċiżjoni tagħhom jekk jitgħallmu jitniżżlu, jikkodifikaw u jiddekoduċu wkoll kliem li ma jseħħux ta’ spiss fis-sett tat-taħriġ.', 'lt': 'Rengiant model į referencinio dialogo žaidimų spėjamumo klausimais, geriausias model is paprastai pasirenkamas atsižvelgiant į jo užduočių sėkmę. Mes rodome, kad taikant populiarų metodą nuo pabaigos, šis pasirinkimas neleidžia modeliui mokytis kurti kalbų požiūriu turtingesnių dialogų, nes kalbų kompetencijos įgijimas trunka ilgiau nei įspėjamojo uždavinio mokymasis. Palygindami skirtingus žaidimus žaidžiančius modelius (GuessWhat, GuessWhich ir Mutual Friends), mes rodome, kad šis neatitikimas yra modelio ir užduočių agnostika. We investigate whether and when better language quality could lead to higher task success.  Mes parodome, kad GuessWhat modeliai galėtų padidinti jų tikslumą, jei jie mokytųsi įžeminti, koduoti ir dekoduoti taip pat žodžius, kurie dažnai neatvyksta mokymo rinkinyje.', 'ml': 'റെഫറന്റല്\u200d ഡയലോഗ് ഊഹിക്കുന്ന കളികളില്\u200d ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d, അതിന്റെ ജോലിയുടെ വിജയം അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട അവസാന സാഹചര്യത്തില്\u200d ഈ തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നത് ഭാഷയില്\u200d സമ്പന്നതയുള്ള സംസാരം ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്ന് പഠിക്കാന്\u200d മാത്രം തടഞ്ഞു വ്യത്യസ്ത കളികള്\u200d കളിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d മുഖം നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. ഈ വ്യത്യാസം മോഡല്\u200d- ജോലിയുടെ അഗ്നോസ്റ്റിക്കാണ്. നമ്മള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നത് ഭാഷ കൂടുതല്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷയുടെ ഗുണവും കൂടുതല്\u200d ജോലിയുടെ വിജയ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നത് ഗസ്ചോയില്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് നിലത്ത്, കോഡോഡ് ചെയ്യാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d, പ്രാവശ്യം ട്രെ', 'mn': 'Сургуулийн диалогын загварыг суралцах үед хамгийн шилдэг загвар нь ажлын амжилтын тулд сонгогддог. Бид олон хүмүүсийн төгсгөл хүртэл зогсохын тулд энэ сонголт нь хэлний баян диалогуудыг суралцахын тулд загварыг зогсоох боломжтой болгодог. Өөр төрлийн тоглоомуудыг харьцуулахад (GuessWhat, GuessWhich, хоорондын найзууд) бид энэ ялгаа загвар, ажлын агностик гэдгийг харуулдаг. Бид илүү сайн хэл чанарыг ажлын амжилтад хүргэж чадах эсэхийг судалж байна. Бид "GuessWhat" дахь загвар нь суралцаж, кодлож, ихэвчлэн суралцахгүй үгсийг ихэвчлэн нэмэгдүүлж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'Podczas treningu modelu w odniesieniowych grach zgadujących dialog, najlepszy model jest zwykle wybierany na podstawie sukcesu jego zadania. Pokazujemy, że w popularnym podejściu end-to-end wybór ten uniemożliwia modelowi naukę generowania bogatszych językowo dialogów, ponieważ nabycie biegłości językowej trwa dłużej niż nauka zadania zgadywania. Porównując modele grające w różne gry (GuessWhat, GuessWhat i Mutual Friends), pokazujemy, że ta rozbieżność jest niezależna od modelu i zadań. Badamy, czy i kiedy lepsza jakość języka może prowadzić do większego sukcesu zadania. Pokazujemy, że w GuessWhat modele mogą zwiększyć swoją dokładność, jeśli nauczą się uziemiać, kodować i dekodować również słowa, które nie występują często w zestawie treningowym.', 'no': "Når opplæring av eit modell på referanseldialogvindauget gjetar spel, vert det beste modellen vanlegvis valt basert på oppgåva sin suksess. Vi viser at i den populære tilnærminga til slutten kan dette valet hindra modellen frå læring til å laga språk rikere dialogar, sidan opptak av språkprofeitet tar lengre enn læring av gjeståande oppgåve. På sammenligning av modeller som speler ulike spel (GuessWhat, GuessWhich, and Mutual Friends), viser vi at denne diskrepansen er modell- og task- agnostic. Vi undersøker om språkkvaliteten kan føra til høgare oppgåver. Vi viser at i GuessWhat, models can increase their accuracy if they learn to ground, code and decode also words that don't happen frequently in the training set.", 'ro': 'Atunci când pregătiți un model pe jocurile de ghicit ale dialogului referențial, cel mai bun model este de obicei ales în funcție de succesul sarcinii sale. Aratăm că în abordarea populară end-to-end, această alegere împiedică modelul să învețe pentru a genera dialoguri mai bogate din punct de vedere lingvistic, deoarece dobândirea competențelor lingvistice durează mai mult decât învățarea sarcinii de ghicit. Comparând modele care joacă diferite jocuri (GuessWhat, GuessWhich și Prieteni comuni), arătăm că această discrepanță este model- și sarcină-agnostică. Investigăm dacă și când o calitate mai bună a limbii ar putea duce la un succes mai mare al sarcinilor. Aratăm că în GuessWhat, modelele ar putea crește acuratețea lor dacă învață să măcinată, să codeze și să decodeze, de asemenea, cuvinte care nu apar frecvent în setul de antrenament.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය සංවාදයේ සංවාදයේ ප්\u200dරධානයක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න, සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂයෙන් හොඳම මොඩේල් තෝරග අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරජාතික අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න මොඩල් එක ප්\u200dරතිකාර කරනවා භාෂාවික විශ්වාසිතාවට වඩා වැඩියි  වෙනස් සෙල්ලම් වෙනුවෙන් සෙල්ලම් කරනවා මොඩේල් සෙල්ලම් කරනවා (අහන්න මොකද්ද, අහන්න මොකද්ද, සම්බන්ධ යාළුවෝ, අපි පෙ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා හොඳ භාෂාව සුභාවට වඩා වැඩි වැඩේ සාර්ථක විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා. අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අහන්නේ මොඩල් එක්ක ඔවුන්ගේ හරියට වැඩි කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, ඔවුන් පැත්තෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න, කොඩ් කරන්න, ඒ වගේම', 'sv': 'När man tränar en modell på referensdialoggissningsspel väljs oftast den bästa modellen utifrån uppgiftens framgång. Vi visar att detta val i den populära end-to-end-metoden hindrar modellen från att lära sig att generera språkligt rikare dialoger, eftersom det tar längre tid att förvärva språkkunskaper än att lära sig gissningsuppgiften. Genom att jämföra modeller som spelar olika spel (GuessWhat, GuessWhich och ömsesidiga vänner), visar vi att denna avvikelse är modell- och uppgiftsagnostisk. Vi undersöker om och när bättre språkkvalitet kan leda till högre uppgifts framgång. Vi visar att modeller i GuessWhat kan öka sin noggrannhet om de lär sig att slipa, koda och avkoda även ord som inte förekommer ofta i träningsuppsättningen.', 'sr': 'Kada treniramo model na referencijskom dijalogu, najbolji model se obično odabere na osnovu uspeha zadataka. Pokazujemo da u popularnom pristupu do kraja, taj izbor sprečava model da se uči da stvara jezički bogatiji dijalog, pošto je prikupljanje jezičkog profila potrebno duže od učenja pogađajućeg zadataka. Uspoređujući modele koji igraju različite igre (pogodite šta, pogodite što i zajedničke prijatelje), pokazujemo da je ova neslaganost modela i agnostika zadatka. Istražujemo da li i kada bi bolje jezičke kvalitete mogle dovesti do većeg uspeha zadataka. Pokazujemo da u GuessWhat, modeli bi mogli povećati preciznost ako nauče da podzemnu, kodiraju i dekodiraju takođe reči koje se ne dešavaju često u setu obuke.', 'so': 'Markii lagu tababariyo tusaale ku saabsan dialogue-reference oo ku saabsan ciyaar la garto, waxaa inta badan lagu doortaa noocyada ugu wanaagsan oo ku saleysan liibaanta shaqada. Waxaynu muujinnaa in qaababka ugu dambaysa ee dadka u dhow uu sameynayo qaababkan uu sameynayo in uu sameeyo dialogueoyin luuqada ku hodanan, sababtoo ah helitaanka aqoonta luqadu waxay qaadan tahay in ka badan waxbarashada shaqada fikirka. Isbarbardhigta muusikada ciyaarta kala duduwan (GuessWhat, GuessWhich, iyo saaxiibbo saaxiibada u dhexeeya) waxaynu muujinnaa in takoorkanu yahay model- iyo shaqo-aragnimo. Waxaannu baaraynaa in ay u baahan karto qiimaha luuqada, iyo goorma ay u fiican karto liibaanta shaqada sare. Waxan tusnaynaa in tusaalayaasha GuessWhat ay kordhi karaan saxda, haddii ay bartaan inay dhulka, kooban karaan iyo sidoo kale ku qoran erayo aan marar badan ka dhicin koronta waxbarashada.', 'ta': 'புதிய உரையாடல் ஆட்டத்தை உருவாக்கும் பொழுது ஒரு மாதிரி பயிற்சி செய்யும் போது, சிறந்த மாதிரி வழக்கமாக அதன் பணி  பிரபஞ்சமான முடிவு செயல்பாட்டில், இந்த தேர்வு மாதிரியை கற்று மொழியில் வளர்ந்த உரையாடல் உருவாக்குவதை தடுக்கிறது, ஏனெனில் மொழியின் சிறப்பு பெறுவத வேறு விளையாட்டுகளை ஒப்பிடுவதால் (GuessWhat, GuessWhich, மற்றும் தொடர் நண்பர்கள்) இந்த வித்தியாசம் மாதிரி- மற்றும் பணி குறுக்கும் தோற்றம்  நாம் சிறந்த மொழி தரம் உயர்ந்த வெற்றியை கொண்டு வருமா என்று ஆராய்ச்சி செய்கிறோம். நாம் குவெஸ்என்று காட்டுகிறோம், மாதிரிகள் நிலத்தில், குறியீட்டில் கற்றால் சரியான வார்த்தைகளை அதிகரிக்க முடியும் மற்றும்', 'ur': 'جب ایک نمڈل کی تعلیم کرتی ہے اس کے مسائل کامیابی پر، بہترین نمڈل کا انتخاب کیا جاتا ہے۔ ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ لشکر آخر و آخر کے طریقے میں، یہ انتخاب موڈل کو سیکھنے سے روکتا ہے زبان کے طور پر ثروت والی گفتگو پیدا کرنے کے لئے، کیونکہ زبان پرفائسٹی کا حاصل ہونا گمان کے کام کی تعلیم سے زیادہ طویل ہے. ماڈل کے مطابق مختلف کھیل کھیل رہے ہیں ہم تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ کیا اور جب بہترین زبان کی کیفیت زیادہ کامیابی کے لئے پہنچا سکتی ہے۔ ہم اسے معلوم کرتے ہیں کہ مثالیں ان کی دقیق اضافہ کر سکتے ہیں اگر وہ زمین پر سیکھتے ہیں، کوڈ کرتے ہیں اور ایسے کلمات کو بھی دھوکا دیتے ہیں جن کی تعلیم مجموعہ میں اضافہ نہیں ہوتی۔', 'uz': "Name Biz ko'rsatganimizni ko'rsatganimiz, bu tanlangan foydalanish modeli tillarda o'rganishni o'rganishdan foydalanadi, chunki tillarning muhimligini olishni o'rganishdan uzoq qoladi. Uskuna boshqa oʻyinlarni o'zgartirish modellari (GuessWhat, GuessWhich, va Mutual Friends) bilan o'xshash bilan birlashtirish mumkin, bu ajoylik model- va vazifa agnostik. Biz juda yaxshi tilning sifatida eng yaxshi muvaffaqiyatga erishishi mumkin. Biz GuessWhat'da modellar soni, kodlash usulini o'rganib, va ko'paytirishni o'rganadigan so'zlarni ko'rsatish mumkin, va ko'pincha o'rganish qo'llanmagan so'zlarni ko'paytirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Khi huấn luyện một mô hình về trò chơi đoán mơ ước, người mẫu tốt nhất thường được chọn dựa trên thành công của nó. Chúng tôi cho thấy rằng trong phương pháp kết thúc phổ biến, lựa chọn này ngăn cản người mẫu học cách tạo ra các cuộc đối thoại ngôn ngữ giàu có hơn, vì kiếm được khả năng ngôn ngữ tốn thời gian hơn việc học tập đoán. Bằng cách so sánh các mô hình đang chơi các trò khác nhau (GuessWhat, GuessWho, và Mutual Friends), chúng tôi cho thấy sự khác biệt này là model- và nhiệm-chẩn bị. Chúng tôi tìm hiểu liệu và khi nào chất lượng ngôn ngữ tốt hơn có thể làm nhiệm vụ thành công hơn. Chúng tôi cho thấy rằng ở GuessWhat, các mô hình có thể tăng độ chính xác của họ nếu họ học cách khai quật, mã hóa và giải cũng có những từ không thường xuyên trong bộ huấn luyện.', 'bg': 'При обучението на модел за референтни диалогови гадаещи игри, най-добрият модел обикновено се избира въз основа на успеха на задачата му. Показваме, че в популярния подход от край до край този избор пречи на модела да се научи да генерира лингвистично по-богати диалози, тъй като придобиването на езикова компетентност отнема повече време, отколкото ученето на задачата за гадаене. Сравнявайки модели, играещи различни игри (Познай какво, Познай кои и Взаимни приятели), ние показваме, че това несъответствие е модел-и задача-агностика. Проучваме дали и кога по-доброто качество на езика може да доведе до по-висок успех на задачата. Показваме, че в "Познай какво" моделите могат да увеличат точността си, ако се научат да заземяват, кодират и декодират и думи, които не се срещат често в комплекта за обучение.', 'da': 'Når du træner en model i referential dialog gættespil, vælges den bedste model normalt baseret på dens opgave succes. Vi viser, at dette valg i den populære end-to-end tilgang forhindrer modellen i at lære at generere sprogligt rigere dialoger, da erhvervelsen af sprogfærdigheder tager længere tid end at lære gætteopgaven. Ved at sammenligne modeller, der spiller forskellige spil (GuessWhat, GuessWhich og Gensidige Venner), viser vi, at denne uoverensstemmelse er model- og opgaveagnostisk. Vi undersøger, om og hvornår bedre sprogkvalitet kan føre til større opgaveudfald. Vi viser, at i GuessWhat, modeller kan øge deres nøjagtighed, hvis de lærer at jorden, kode og afkode også ord, der ikke forekommer ofte i træningssættet.', 'hr': 'Kada se obučava model za pogađajuće igre referencijskog dijaloga, najbolji model se obično odabere na temelju uspjeha zadatka. Pokazujemo da u popularnom pristupu do kraja, taj izbor sprečava model da uči da stvara jezički bogatije dijaloge, jer prikupljanje jezičkih profila potrebno je duže od učenja pogađajućeg zadatka. Uspoređujući modele koji igraju različite igre (GuessWhat, GuessWhich, i zajedničke prijatelje), pokazujemo da je ova nesporaznost model- i zadatak-agnostična. Istražujemo da li i kada bi bolje kvalitete jezika mogle dovesti do većeg uspjeha zadatka. Pokazujemo da u GuessWhat, modeli bi mogli povećati preciznost ako nauče da podzemnu, kodiraju i dekodiraju također riječi koje se često ne događaju u setu obuke.', 'nl': 'Bij het trainen van een model op referentiele dialoog gokspellen, wordt meestal het beste model gekozen op basis van het succes van de taak. We laten zien dat in de populaire end-to-end benadering deze keuze voorkomt dat het model leert om taalkundige rijkere dialogen te genereren, omdat het verwerven van taalvaardigheid langer duurt dan het leren van de raadtaak. Door modellen te vergelijken die verschillende games spelen (GuessWhat, GuessWhit en Mutual Friends), laten we zien dat deze discrepantie model- en taakagnostisch is. We onderzoeken of en wanneer een betere taalkwaliteit kan leiden tot een hoger taakverslag. We laten zien dat modellen in GuessWhat hun nauwkeurigheid kunnen verhogen als ze ook woorden leren aarden, coderen en decoderen die niet vaak voorkomen in de trainingsset.', 'de': 'Beim Training eines Modells auf referenziellen Dialograten wird normalerweise das beste Modell basierend auf seinem Aufgabenerfolg ausgewählt. Wir zeigen, dass im populären End-to-End-Ansatz diese Wahl verhindert, dass das Modell lernt, sprachlich reichere Dialoge zu generieren, da der Erwerb von Sprachkenntnissen länger dauert als das Erlernen der Rateaufgabe. Durch den Vergleich von Modellen, die verschiedene Spiele spielen (GuessWhat, GuessWhich und Mutual Friends), zeigen wir, dass diese Diskrepanz Modell- und Task-agnostisch ist. Wir untersuchen, ob und wann eine bessere Sprachqualität zu einem höheren Aufgabenerfolg führen könnte. Wir zeigen, dass Modelle in GuessWhat ihre Genauigkeit erhöhen können, wenn sie lernen, auch Wörter zu erden, codieren und decodieren, die im Trainingsset nicht häufig vorkommen.', 'ko': '대화 퀴즈 게임에서 훈련 모형을 참고할 때, 보통 임무 성공률에 따라 최적 모형을 선택한다.우리는 유행하는 단말기부터 단말기까지의 방법에서 이러한 선택이 모델 학습이 언어를 생성하는 데 더욱 풍부한 대화를 막는 것을 발견했다. 왜냐하면 언어 숙련도를 얻는 것이 추측 임무를 배우는 것보다 더 긴 시간이 걸리기 때문이다.서로 다른 게임을 하는 모델을 비교함으로써 우리는 이러한 차이는 모델과 임무가 알 수 없다는 것을 알 수 있다.우리는 더 좋은 언어 품질이 언제 더 높은 임무 성공률을 가져올 수 있는지 조사했다.추측에서 모델이 훈련에 집중되지 않는 단어에 대한 접지, 인코딩, 디코딩을 배울 수 있다면 정확성을 높일 수 있을 것으로 보인다.', 'fa': 'وقتی یک مدل روی بازی\u200cهای تأخیر گفتگوی گزارش، بهترین مدل معمولا بر اساس موفقیت کارش انتخاب می\u200cشود. ما نشان می دهیم که در طریق پایان و پایان مشهور این انتخاب مانع مدل یادگیری برای تولید گفتگوهای ثروتمند زبان است، از آنجا که پیدا کردن پژوهش زبان بیشتر از یادگیری از کار حدس زدن طول می کشد. با مقایسه کردن مدلهای بازی های مختلف (حدس بزنید که چی، حدس بزنید و دوستان متفاوتی) نشان می دهیم که این اختلاف مدل و تابع-agnostic است. ما تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که آیا و زمانی که کیفیت زبان بهتر می\u200cتواند به موفقیت کارهای بیشتری برساند. ما نشان می دهیم که در حدس چی، نمونه\u200cها می\u200cتوانند دقیقات آنها را افزایش دهند اگر آنها یاد بگیرند که زمین را یاد بگیرند، رمزبندی کنند و کلمات را هم دکود کنند که اغلب در مجموعه آموزش اتفاق نمی\u200cافتد.', 'sw': 'Wakati kufundisha muundo wa mazungumzo ya maoni kuhusu michezo ya kudhani michezo, mfano bora zaidi mara nyingi huchaguliwa kwa sababu ya mafanikio yake ya kazi. Tunaonyesha kuwa katika mbinu maarufu ya mwisho, uchaguzi huu unazuia muundo wa kujifunza kutengeneza mazungumzo yenye utajiri wa lugha, kwa sababu upatikanaji wa ujuzi wa lugha unachukua muda mrefu kuliko kujifunza kazi ya dhana. Kwa kulinganisha mifano inayocheza michezo tofauti (GuessWhat, GuessWhich, na Marafiki wa Kijamaa), tunaonyesha kuwa utofauti huu ni model- na upuuzi wa kazi. Tunatachunguza kama na lini ubora wa lugha bora unaweza kusababisha mafanikio makubwa ya kazi. Tunaonyesha kwamba katika GuessWhat, mifano inaweza kuongeza ukweli wao kama wanajifunza kuingia chini, kutangaza na pia kupunguza maneno ambayo hayatokea mara kwa mara katika seti ya mafunzo.', 'sq': 'Kur trajnohet një model mbi dialogun referencial për të menduar lojrat, modeli më i mirë zgjidhet zakonisht bazuar në suksesin e detyrës së tij. Ne tregojmë se në qasjen popullore nga fundi në fund, ky zgjedhje pengon model in nga mësimi për të gjeneruar dialoge më të pasura gjuhësore, pasi fitimi i aftësisë gjuhësore merr më gjatë se mësimi i detyrës së parashikimit. Duke krahasuar modelet që luajnë lojra të ndryshme (GuessWhat, GuessWhich, dhe miqtë e ndërsjelltë), ne tregojmë se kjo mospërputhje është model- dhe task-agnostic. Ne hetojmë nëse dhe kur cilësia më e mirë e gjuhës mund të shpjerë në sukses më të lartë të detyrës. Ne tregojmë se në GuessWhat, modelet mund të rritin saktësinë e tyre në qoftë se mësojnë të themelojnë, të kodojnë dhe të dekodiojnë gjithashtu fjalë që nuk ndodhin shpesh në grupin e trajnimit.', 'af': "Wanneer 'n model op verwysing dialoog oog speletjies, word die beste model gewoonlik gekies gebaseer op sy taak sukses. Ons wys dat in die populêre end-to-end toegang, hierdie keuse verhinder die model om te leer om lingwisiese ryker dialoog te genereer, omdat die aanvang van taal profiesiteit langer neem as die leer van die gastaak. Deur die vergelyking van modele wat verskillende speletjies speel (GuessWhat, GuessWhich, en Mutual vriende), ons wys dat hierdie skielikheid model- en task- agnostic is. Ons ondersoek of en wanneer beter taal kwaliteit na hoër taak sukses kan lei. Ons wys dat in GuessWhat, models could increase their accuracy as they learn to ground, encode and decode also words that don't occur frequently in the training set.", 'tr': 'Referanslar dialog oýunlarynda nusga okuwýanda, iň gowy nusga adatça öz işi başarylygyna daýanýar. Biz meşhur soňunda soňky ýaryşda görkezýäris, bu saýlamak nusgasyny dil bagtly dialoglary döretmäge mane edýär, sebäbi dil ukyplaryny almak myhmanlaryň görevini öwrenmesinden köp wagt galýar. Farklı oýunlar çalýan nusgalary görä çykaryp (GuessWhat, GuessWhich, we Mutual Dostler), bu çykyşyk nusgadyr we görev-agnostik diýip görkezilýän. Biz diliň gowy görnüşligini ýokary başaryp bilmeýändigini soradyk. Bilýän maglumatlarda nusgalaryň dogrylygyny ýer taýýarlap, kodlaşyp bilmeýän sözlerini hem köpräk taýýarlap bilerdigini görkezip bileris.', 'am': 'የሥርዓት አካባቢ አካባቢ አካሄድ መክፈት በተደረገ ጊዜ የተሻለ ሞዴል በሥራው ማቀናኘት በመሠረት ላይ ይመረጣል፡፡ በቋንቋው ቋንቋ ሀብታም ማድረግ የሚከለክል ምሳሌ ሲሆን የቋንቋ እውቀት ማግኘት ስራ ከመማር ይልቅ ረጅም ይኖራል፡፡ የተለያዩ ጨዋታ ጨዋታዎች (GuessWhat, GuessWhich እና ሁለተኛ ወዳጆች) እናስተያየዋለን፡፡ የቋንቋ ጥሩ መሆኑንና ማንኛውን ትልቅ ስራ ማግኘት ይችላል ብለን እናይረዳለን፡፡ በመንግሥት እናሳያቸዋለን፣ ሞዴላዎች መሬት፣ የኮድ መሆኑን ቢማሩ እና ብዙ ጊዜ በተስተማሪው ተቃውሞ የማይደርሱትን ቃላት እንዲጨምሩ ይችላል፡፡', 'az': "Referential dialog oyunlarının modelini təhsil etdikdə ən yaxşı modeli olaraq işlərinin başarısızlığına görə seçilir. Bizim göstəririk ki, məşhur sonun-sonun tərzində, bu seçim modeli dil dilində daha zengin danışmaları yaratmağa mane edir, çünki dil tərzindən alınması zənnə işlərini öyrənməkdən daha uzun sürər. Müxtəlif oyunlar oynayan modelləri ilə qarşılaşdırmaq vasitəsilə (Guess What, GuessWhich, və Mutual Friends), bu müxtəlif modellər və task-agnostik olduğunu göstəririk. Biz daha yaxşı dil keyfiyyətinin daha yüksək iş başarısına yol verəcəyini təşkil edirik. Biz GuessWhat'da modellərin do ğruluqlarını artıracağını göstəririk ki, əgər onlar yerə, kodlamağı öyrənsələr və təhsil setində sık-sıq olmayan sözləri də kodlayabilirlər.", 'bn': 'যখন গণনাল ডায়ালগ অনুমোদনের ব্যাপারে একটি মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ করা হয়, তখন সাধারণত তার কাজের সফল ভিত্তিতে সেরা মডেল নির্বা আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে জনপ্রিয় শেষ পর্যন্ত ক্ষেত্রে এই বিকল্প ভাষায় ভাষায় সমৃদ্ধ কথোপকথন তৈরি করা থেকে মডেল বাধা দেয়, যেহেতু ভাষার দক্ষতা পেতে অনুমান করা  মোডেল বিভিন্ন খেলা খেলার মাধ্যমে (গুস্তো, গুয়েস্থ এবং মিউটুয়াল ফ্রেন্ড) তুলনা করে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই বৈষম্য হচ্ছে মডেল- এবং কা আমরা অনুসন্ধান করি ভাষার মান বেশী ভালো কাজের সাফল্যের দিকে আরো ভালো হতে পারে কিনা। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে গুয়েস্টোতে মডেল তাদের সঠিকভাবে বৃদ্ধি করতে পারে যদি তারা মাটি, এনকোড এবং প্রশিক্ষণ সেটে প্রায়শই ঘটে না।', 'bs': 'Kada obučavamo model na referencijskom dijalogu pogađajući igre, najbolji model se obično odabere na temelju uspjeha zadatka. Pokazujemo da u popularnom pristupu do kraja, ovaj izbor sprječava model da uči da stvara jezički bogatije dijaloge, jer prikupljanje jezičkih profila traje duže od učenja pogađajućeg zadatka. Uspoređujući modele koji igraju različite igre (GuessWhat, GuessWhich, i zajedničke prijatelje), pokazujemo da je ova neslaganost modela i agnostična zadatka. Istražujemo da li i kada bi bolje kvalitete jezika mogle dovesti do većeg uspjeha zadatka. Pokazujemo da u GuessWhat, modeli bi mogli povećati preciznost ako nauče da podzemnu, kodiraju i dekodiraju i riječi koje se često ne dešavaju u setu obuke.', 'ca': "Quan treinem un model en el diàleg referencial de gueta de jocs, el millor model es selecciona segons l'èxit de la seva tasca. Mostrem que en l'enfocament popular de final a final, aquesta elecció evita que el model aprenga a generar diàlegs lingüísticament més rics, ja que l'adquisició de la capacitat lingüística triga més temps que aprendre la tasca d'endevinament. Comparant models que juguen a diferents jocs (GuessWhat, GuessWhich, i Mutual Friends), demostram que aquesta discrepancia és model- i tasca-agnòstica. Investiguem si i quan una millor qualitat del llenguatgepodria portar a un èxit més gran de la tasca. Mostrem que en GuessWhat, els models podrien augmentar la seva precisió si aprenguin a terrar, codificar i descodificar també paraules que no ocorren sovint en el conjunt d'entrenaments.", 'id': 'Ketika melatih model pada dialog referensi menebak permainan, model terbaik biasanya dipilih berdasarkan sukses tugasnya. Kami menunjukkan bahwa dalam pendekatan popular akhir-akhir, pilihan ini mencegah model dari belajar untuk menghasilkan dialog yang lebih kaya secara bahasa, karena pengakuan keterampilan bahasa mengambil lebih lama daripada belajar tugas tebakan. Dengan membandingkan model yang bermain permainan yang berbeda (GuessWhat, GuessWhich, dan Mutual Friends), kami menunjukkan bahwa ketidakcocokan ini adalah model- dan tugas-agnostik. Kami menyelidiki apakah dan kapan kualitas bahasa yang lebih baik bisa menyebabkan sukses tugas yang lebih tinggi. Kami menunjukkan bahwa dalam GuessWhat, model dapat meningkatkan akurasi mereka jika mereka belajar untuk mendarat, mengkode, dan dekode juga kata-kata yang tidak sering terjadi dalam set latihan.', 'cs': 'Při tréninku modelu na odhadovacích hrách referenčního dialogu se nejlepší model obvykle vybírá na základě úspěchu úkolu. Ukazujeme, že v oblíbeném end-to-end přístupu tato volba brání modelu v učení se generovat jazykově bohatší dialogy, protože získání jazykové znalosti trvá déle než naučení se hádat. Porovnáním modelů hrajících různé hry (GuessWhat, GuessWhich a Mutual Friends) ukazujeme, že tato nesrovnalost je model- a úkol-agnostická. Zkoumáme, zda a kdy by lepší jazyková kvalita mohla vést k vyššímu úspěchu úkolů. Ukazujeme, že v GuessWhat by modely mohly zvýšit svou přesnost, pokud se naučí uzemnit, kódovat a dekódovat i slova, která se v tréninkové sadě často nevyskytují.', 'et': 'Referentsialoogi arvamismängude mudeli koolitamisel valitakse parim mudel tavaliselt selle ülesande edukuse põhjal. Näitame, et populaarses otsast otsani lähenemises takistab see valik mudelil õppimast keeleliselt rikkamaid dialooge genereerima, kuna keeleoskuse omandamine võtab kauem aega kui arvamisülesande õppimine. Võrreldes mudeleid, kes mängivad erinevaid mänge (GuessWhat, GuessWhich ja vastastikused sõbrad), näitame, et see lahknevus on mudeli- ja ülesande-agnostiline. Uurime, kas ja millal parem keelekvaliteet võib viia suurema ülesande edu saavutamiseni. Me näitame, et GuessWhat mudelid võivad suurendada oma täpsust, kui nad õpivad maandama, kodeerima ja dekodeerima ka sõnu, mis ei esine sageli treeningkomplektis.', 'fi': 'Referentiaalisen dialogin arvauspelejä harjoitettaessa paras malli valitaan yleensä tehtävän onnistumisen perusteella. Osoitamme, että suositussa end-to-end-lähestymistavassa tämä valinta estää mallia oppimasta kielellisesti rikkaampia dialogeja, koska kielitaidon hankkiminen kestää kauemmin kuin arvailutehtävän oppiminen. Vertailemalla malleja, jotka pelaavat eri pelejä (GuessWhat, GuessWhich ja Mutual Friends), osoitamme, että tämä ero on malli- ja tehtävä-agnostinen. Tutkimme, voisiko parempi kielilaatu johtaa suurempaan onnistumiseen ja milloin. Todistamme, että GuessWhat-ohjelmassa mallit voivat parantaa tarkkuuttaan, jos ne oppivat maadoittamaan, koodaamaan ja purkamaan myös sanoja, joita ei usein esiinny harjoitussarjassa.', 'hy': 'Երբ մի մոդել է վարժեցնում խաղերի համոզմունքների մասին, լավագույն մոդելը սովորաբար ընտրվում է իր խնդրի հաջողության վրա: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ հանրահայտ վերջ-վերջ մոտեցում այս ընտրությունը կանխում է մոդելը լեզվաբանական հարուստ խոսակցություններ ստեղծելուց, քանի որ լեզվագիտության ձեռք բերումը ավելի երկար է պահանջվում, քան գուշակելու խնդիրը սովորելը: Համեմատելով տարբեր խաղեր խաղացող մոդելները (Գուցեք, Գուցեք, և Միասնական ընկերները), մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս տարբերությունը մոդել- և խնդիր-ագնոստիկ է: Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, արդյոք և երբ լեզվի ավելի լավ որակը կարող է հանգեցնել ավելի մեծ հաջողության: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ "Գիտեք ինչ"-ում մոդելները կարող են բարձրացնել իրենց ճշգրտությունը, եթե նրանք սովորեն հողը, կոդավորել և կոդավորել նաև բառեր, որոնք հաճախ չեն տեղի ունենում ուսուցման համակարգում:', 'ha': 'Idan an kõre wani misali kan zauren akwatin zauren akwatin mazaɓa na zauren akwatin bayani na Reference, ana ƙayyade shi mafi kyauta a kan salon da babban aiki. Tuna nũna cewa, a cikin shirin ƙarami zuwa ƙari, wannan zaɓi yana hana misalin ya sanar ta zauren zauren akwatin cikin linguin da aka ƙara, kwani ana ƙara da kami ya sami karatun karatun tsari ga aikin zato. Ina samfani da misãlai waɗanda ke yin gamuwa daban-daban (GuesWhat, Gueswhich, da kuma Friend Mutum), muna nũna wa wannan gauranci ya zama misalin- da-agnostic. Munã jarraba, ko da kuma idan mafi kyaun harshen zai iya ƙara mafanici ga aikin. Muna nũna, a cikin GuesWhat, misãlai za su ƙara tabbatarsu idan sun iya sani zuwa ƙasa, kode, kuma suna da kalmõmi wanda ba su iya fara a cikin tsarin da ake yi musu.', 'he': 'When training a model on referential dialogue guessing games, the best model is usually chosen based on its task success.  אנחנו מראים שבגישה פופולרית סוף-סוף, הבחירה הזאת מונעת מהמודל מללמד ליצור דיאלוגים עשירים יותר בשפה, מאחר שהרכישה של מיומנות שפה לוקחת יותר זמן מללמד את משימת הנחשה. על ידי השוואה מודלים משחקים משחקים שונים (GuessWhat, GuessWhich, וחברים משותפים), אנחנו מראים שהניתוח הזה הוא מודל- ומשימה-אגנוסטי. אנחנו חוקרים אם וכאשר איכות שפה טובה יותר יכולה להוביל להצלחה במשימה גבוהה יותר. אנחנו מראים שבGuessWhat, דוגמנים יכולים להעלות את מדויקתם אם הם ללמוד לקרקע, לקודד, ולפיענח גם מילים שלא מתרחשות לעתים קרובות בסט האימונים.', 'sk': 'Pri usposabljanju modela o ugibanju referenčnih dialogov se najboljši model običajno izbere glede na uspeh naloge. Pokazali smo, da v priljubljenem pristopu od konca do konca ta izbira modelu preprečuje učenje ustvarjanja jezikovno bogatejših dialogov, saj pridobivanje znanja jezika traja dlje kot učenje ugibanja. S primerjavo modelov, ki igrajo različne igre (GuessWhat, GuessWhich in Mutual Friends), pokažemo, da je to neskladje model- in nalogo-agnostično. Raziskujemo, ali in kdaj bi lahko boljša kakovost jezika vodila do večjega uspeha naloge. Pokazali smo, da lahko v GuessWhat modeli povečajo svojo natančnost, če se naučijo označiti, kodirati in dekodirati tudi besede, ki se ne pojavljajo pogosto v naboru vadb.', 'bo': 'དཔེ་དབྱིབས་གཏོང་མཁན་གྱི་ཌའི་ལོག་བློ་གཏོང་སྐབས་རྣམ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་རྩེད་དམ། ང་ཚོས་མི་མང་གི་གྲངས་འབྱོར་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་ནང་དུ་འདིའི་གདམ་ཀ་འདིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་གཤིས་ཆེ་བ་བཟོ་བཅུག རྩེདམོ་མི་འདྲ་བ་རྩེ་མོ་འདྲ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་པ་ལས། ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་གཙང་ཚད་ལེགས་ཤིན་ཏུ་ལྡན་འགྲོ་ན་འགྲོ་བ་མིན་ནམ། ང་ཚོས་རྟོགས་པ་དེ་རྟོགས་པའམ་མིག', 'jv': 'paragraphing Awak dhéwé éntuk wong lan nganggo populer end-to-end kuwi, pilihan iki iso nggawe modèl kuwi nggawe dialog yang cukup maning, dadi kebutuhan kelas perusahaan langkung sampeyan luwih apik. Ngawe nambah model sing sampeyan dolanan ping sampeyan (GossWh, GossWh, lan Kemerdekaan Puteran), kita ngomong nik kabèhku kuwi wis model lan task-ageostik. Awak dhéwé ngerasah piye-ngopo awak dhéwé kuwi luwih luwih apik bakal seneng nggawe barang luwih dumadhi. Awak dhéwé ngerasakno karo Kemerdekaan Winih, model iso nggawe kesempatan karo awak dhéwé mulai, kode lan dekoraké awak dhéwé kuwi ora bisa pasakno sakjane sakjane terus-nku.'}
{'en': 'Are you kidding me? : Detecting Unpalatable Questions on Reddit', 'ar': '"هل تمزح معي؟": الكشف عن الأسئلة غير المستساغة على Reddit', 'pt': '“Você está brincando comigo?”: Detectando perguntas intragáveis no Reddit', 'fr': '«\xa0Tu te moques de moi\xa0?\xa0» : Détecter les questions désagréables sur Reddit', 'es': '«¿Me estás tomando el pelo?» : Detección de preguntas desagradables en Reddit', 'ja': '「冗談でしょうか？ ”: Redditでの不適切な質問の検出', 'hi': '"क्या आप मुझसे मजाक कर रहे हैं?": Reddit पर अप्रिय प्रश्नों का पता लगाना', 'zh': '"子戏我乎?":见不快于Reddit', 'ru': '«Ты издеваешься надо мной?”: Обнаружение неприятных вопросов на Reddit', 'ga': '“An bhfuil tú ag magadh orm?”: Ag Brath Ceisteanna Do-ghlactha ar Reddit', 'ka': '"ქვდსგაქ ლთ ჟვ?" Name', 'hu': '"Most viccelsz?" Az ízletes kérdések észlelése Redditen', 'el': '"Πλάκα μου κάνεις;": Ανίχνευση δυσάρεστων ερωτήσεων στο Reddit', 'it': '"Mi prendi in giro?" Rilevare domande sgradevoli su Reddit', 'kk': '"Маған шейіп тұрсың ба?" Қайта өзгертілген сұрақтарды анықтау', 'mk': '"Ме заебаваш?\': Детектирање непројатни прашања за Reddit', 'lt': '"Jūs juokaujate?" Nepalankių klausimų dėl Reddit nustatymas', 'ms': "'Adakah anda bergurau saya?': Detecting Unpalatable Questions on Reddit", 'ml': 'നീ എന്നെ തമാശ പറയുകയാണോ? റെഡിറ്റില്\u200d ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': '"Are you kidding me?": Is-Sejbien ta’ Mistoqsijiet Mhux Ripalabbli dwar Reddit', 'mn': '"Чи надад зугаатай юу?" гэв. Reddit-ийн тухай санамсаргүй асуултуудыг олох', 'no': '"Snøggjer du meg?" Oppdagar uavhengige spørsmål ved redigering', 'ro': '"Glumeşti?" Detectarea întrebărilor inacceptabile pe Reddit', 'sr': 'Šališ se? Otkrivanje neprijateljskih pitanja na Reddit', 'pl': '"Żartujesz sobie?" Wykrywanie niesmacznych pytań na Reddit', 'si': '"ඔයා මට විහිළු කරනවද?" Name', 'so': "'Ma igu majaajiloonaysaa?': Qiimeynta su'aalaha aan la heli karin", 'sv': '"Skämtar du med mig?" Upptäcka otillåtliga frågor på Reddit', 'ta': "'Are you kidding me?':  Reddit இல் இருக்காத கேள்விகளை கண்டுபிடிக்கும்", 'ur': 'کیا تم مجھے مذاق اڑاتے ہو؟ راڈیٹ پر غیر قابل سوال پتہ رہے ہیں', 'uz': "'Are you kidding me?':  Reddit bilan hech qanday savollar aniqlanmoqda", 'vi': '"Bạn đang đùa tôi sao?" Việc phát hiện câu hỏi về Reddit', 'da': '"Laver du sjov med mig?" Opdagelse af uønskelige spørgsmål på Reddit', 'bg': '"Шегуваш ли се?" Откриване на неприятни въпроси в Редит', 'hr': 'Šališ se? Otkrivanje neprijateljskih pitanja na Redditu', 'nl': "'Maak je een grapje?': Onsmakelijke vragen detecteren op Reddit", 'de': '"Machst du Witze?" Unzufriedene Fragen auf Reddit erkennen', 'ko': '"장난해?":Reddit에서 불쾌한 질문 발견', 'tr': '"Şaka ediňizmi?" Gaýd Etmeýän Soraglary Aňlap', 'id': "'Kau bercanda?': Mengeteksi Pertanyaan Tak Ternyata pada Reddit", 'sw': "'Mnifanyia mzaha?': Kugundua maswali yasiyopatikana", 'am': "እኔን መቀነስ ነው? ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'fa': 'شوخي ميکني؟ شناسایی سؤال غیرقابل آزمایش در Reddit', 'sq': "'Po tallesh me mua?': Duke zbuluar pyetje të pakëndshme mbi Reddit", 'af': '"Het jy my werk?" Ongeldige Vragate ontdek op Reddit', 'bn': "'Are you kidding me?':  রেডিডিটে প্রশ্ন সনাক্ত করা হচ্ছে", 'bs': 'Šališ se? Otkrivanje neprijateljskih pitanja na Reddit', 'hy': '«Դուք ինձ սխալ եք անում»։ Reddit-ի մասին անխուսափելի հարցեր հայտնաբերելը', 'az': 'S…ôn m…ôni …ôyl…ônirs…ôn? Reddit haqqńĪnda qeyri-qeyri suallarńĪ keŇüif edilir', 'fi': '"Vitsailetko?" Havaitsemme epämiellyttäviä kysymyksiä Redditissä', 'et': '"Kas sa teed nalja?" Redditi ebameeldivate küsimuste tuvastamine', 'ca': '"Estàs bromeant-me?" Detecting Unpalatable Questions on Reddit', 'cs': '"Děláš si srandu?" Detekce nepříjemných otázek na Redditu', 'he': 'אתה צוחק עליי? גילוי שאלות בלתי נאות על רדיט', 'bo': '"ཁྱོད་ཀྱིས་ང་འཕགས་རྒྱུ་བཞག་གི་ཡིན་ནམ།" བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་ཐོག་ཏུ་བསམ་བློ་གཏད་མེད་པའི་དྲི་ཚིག་རྟོགས་བྱེད་པ', 'ha': '"Shin kunã kũtsãwa ne?" KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': '"Se šališ?" Odkrivanje neprijetnih vprašanj na Redditu', 'jv': '\'Kowe jeleh po ?: politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness'}
{'en': 'Abusive language in online discourse negatively affects a large number of social media users. Many computational methods have been proposed to address this issue of online abuse. The existing work, however, tends to focus on detecting the more explicit forms of abuse leaving the subtler forms of abuse largely untouched. Our work addresses this gap by making three core contributions. First, inspired by the theory of impoliteness, we propose a novel task of detecting a subtler form of abuse, namely unpalatable questions. Second, we publish a context-aware dataset for the task using data from a diverse set of Reddit communities. Third, we implement a wide array of learning models and also investigate the benefits of incorporating conversational context into computational models. Our results show that modeling subtle abuse is feasible but difficult due to the language involved being highly nuanced and context-sensitive. We hope that future research in the field will address such subtle forms of abuse since their harm currently passes unnoticed through existing detection systems.', 'ar': 'تؤثر اللغة المسيئة في الخطاب عبر الإنترنت سلبًا على عدد كبير من مستخدمي وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. تم اقتراح العديد من الأساليب الحسابية لمعالجة مشكلة إساءة الاستخدام عبر الإنترنت. ومع ذلك ، فإن العمل الحالي يميل إلى التركيز على الكشف عن الأشكال الأكثر وضوحًا لسوء المعاملة التي تترك الأشكال الأكثر دقة من الإساءة دون أن تمس إلى حد كبير. يعالج عملنا هذه الفجوة من خلال تقديم ثلاث مساهمات أساسية. أولاً ، مستوحى من نظرية اللامبالاة ، نقترح مهمة جديدة للكشف عن شكل أكثر دقة من سوء المعاملة ، ألا وهو الأسئلة غير المستساغة. ثانيًا ، ننشر مجموعة بيانات مدركة للسياق للمهمة باستخدام بيانات من مجموعة متنوعة من مجتمعات Reddit. ثالثًا ، نقوم بتنفيذ مجموعة واسعة من نماذج التعلم ونبحث أيضًا في فوائد دمج سياق المحادثة في النماذج الحسابية. تظهر نتائجنا أن نمذجة الإساءة الخفية أمر ممكن ولكنه صعب بسبب اللغة المستخدمة كونها شديدة الدقة وحساسة للسياق. نأمل أن يعالج البحث المستقبلي في هذا المجال مثل هذه الأشكال الدقيقة من الإساءة لأن ضررها يمر حاليًا دون أن يلاحظه أحد من خلال أنظمة الكشف الحالية.', 'fr': "Le langage abusif dans le discours en ligne affecte négativement un grand nombre d'utilisateurs de réseaux sociaux. De nombreuses méthodes informatiques ont été proposées pour résoudre ce problème d'abus en ligne. Les travaux existants ont toutefois tendance à se concentrer sur la détection des formes les plus explicites de maltraitance, laissant les formes les plus subtiles d'abus largement intactes. Notre travail comble cette lacune en apportant trois contributions essentielles. Tout d'abord, inspirés par la théorie de l'impolitesse, nous proposons une nouvelle tâche de détection d'une forme plus subtile d'abus, à savoir des questions déplaisantes. Ensuite, nous publions un ensemble de données contextuel pour la tâche en utilisant les données provenant d'un ensemble diversifié de communautés Reddit. Troisièmement, nous mettons en œuvre un large éventail de modèles d'apprentissage et étudions également les avantages de l'intégration du contexte conversationnel dans les modèles informatiques. Nos résultats montrent que la modélisation d'abus subtils est faisable mais difficile en raison du langage utilisé étant très nuancé et sensible au contexte. Nous espérons que les recherches futures dans ce domaine porteront sur ces formes subtiles d'abus, étant donné que leurs méfaits passent actuellement inaperçus grâce aux systèmes de détection existants.", 'es': 'El lenguaje abusivo en el discurso en línea afecta negativamente a un gran número de usuarios de redes sociales. Se han propuesto muchos métodos computacionales para abordar este problema de abuso en línea. Sin embargo, el trabajo existente tiende a centrarse en detectar las formas más explícitas de abuso, dejando prácticamente intactas las formas más sutiles de abuso. Nuestro trabajo aborda esta brecha haciendo tres contribuciones fundamentales. En primer lugar, inspirados en la teoría de la descortesía, proponemos una tarea novedosa de detectar una forma más sutil de abuso, a saber, preguntas desagradables. En segundo lugar, publicamos un conjunto de datos sensible al contexto para la tarea utilizando datos de un conjunto diverso de comunidades de Reddit. En tercer lugar, implementamos una amplia gama de modelos de aprendizaje y también investigamos los beneficios de incorporar el contexto conversacional en los modelos computacionales. Nuestros resultados muestran que modelar el abuso sutil es factible pero difícil debido a que el lenguaje involucrado es altamente matizado y sensible al contexto. Esperamos que la investigación futura en el campo aborde estas formas sutiles de abuso, ya que su daño actualmente pasa desapercibido a través de los sistemas de detección existentes.', 'pt': 'A linguagem abusiva no discurso online afeta negativamente um grande número de usuários de mídia social. Muitos métodos computacionais têm sido propostos para resolver este problema de abuso online. O trabalho existente, no entanto, tende a se concentrar na detecção das formas mais explícitas de abuso, deixando as formas mais sutis de abuso praticamente intocadas. Nosso trabalho aborda essa lacuna fazendo três contribuições principais. Em primeiro lugar, inspirados pela teoria da impolidez, propomos uma nova tarefa de detectar uma forma mais sutil de abuso, ou seja, perguntas intragáveis. Em segundo lugar, publicamos um conjunto de dados com reconhecimento de contexto para a tarefa usando dados de um conjunto diversificado de comunidades do Reddit. Terceiro, implementamos uma ampla gama de modelos de aprendizagem e também investigamos os benefícios de incorporar o contexto conversacional em modelos computacionais. Nossos resultados mostram que a modelagem de abuso sutil é viável, mas difícil devido à linguagem envolvida ser altamente sutil e sensível ao contexto. Esperamos que pesquisas futuras na área abordem essas formas sutis de abuso, uma vez que seus danos atualmente passam despercebidos pelos sistemas de detecção existentes.', 'ja': 'オンラインでの罵倒は、多数のソーシャルメディアユーザーに悪影響を及ぼします。 オンライン濫用のこの問題に対処するために、多くの計算方法が提案されている。 しかし、既存の仕事は、より明確な虐待の形式を検出することに焦点を当てる傾向があり、ほとんどの場合、より微妙な虐待の形式は手付かずです。 私たちの仕事は、3つの主要な貢献をすることで、このギャップに対処します。 まず、非政治性の理論に触発されて、私たちは、より微妙な虐待の形式、つまり不快な質問を検出するという新しいタスクを提案します。 次に、多様なRedditコミュニティからのデータを使用して、タスクのコンテキストを認識したデータセットを公開します。 第三に、私たちは幅広い学習モデルを実装し、会話的文脈を計算モデルに組み込む利点も調査します。 私たちの結果は、微妙な濫用をモデリングすることは実現可能ですが、関連する言語が非常に微妙で文脈依存的であるために困難であることを示しています。 この分野の今後の研究が、このような微妙な虐待に対処することを願っています。なぜなら、それらの被害は現在既存の検出システムを通過していないからです。', 'zh': '在线语言诟詈,多社交媒体用户生负面影响。 既多设方略以决在线滥。 然见事侧重于检明虐,而微虐略无所染。 吾事以三效补之。 先之以不礼,发之以新,检之以微虐,不快之问也。 其次,用不同Reddit社区之数上下文感知数集。 其三曰,施其学,上下文其利。 吾之的结果表明,建模于微妙,可也;而言高细微差别敏于上下文,是以难也。 愿领方来,究其微滥,以其害目前因检测之统被忽视。', 'hi': 'ऑनलाइन प्रवचन में अपमानजनक भाषा बड़ी संख्या में सोशल मीडिया उपयोगकर्ताओं को नकारात्मक रूप से प्रभावित करती है। ऑनलाइन दुरुपयोग के इस मुद्दे को संबोधित करने के लिए कई कम्प्यूटेशनल तरीकों का प्रस्ताव किया गया है। मौजूदा काम, हालांकि, दुरुपयोग के अधिक स्पष्ट रूपों का पता लगाने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करता है, जिससे दुरुपयोग के सूक्ष्म रूपों को काफी हद तक अछूता छोड़ दिया जाता है। हमारा काम तीन मुख्य योगदान देकर इस अंतर को संबोधित करता है। सबसे पहले, अशिष्टता के सिद्धांत से प्रेरित होकर, हम दुरुपयोग के एक सूक्ष्म रूप का पता लगाने के लिए एक उपन्यास कार्य का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, अर्थात् अप्रिय प्रश्न। दूसरा, हम Reddit समुदायों के एक विविध सेट से डेटा का उपयोग करके कार्य के लिए एक संदर्भ-जागरूक डेटासेट प्रकाशित करते हैं। तीसरा, हम सीखने के मॉडल की एक विस्तृत सरणी को लागू करते हैं और कम्प्यूटेशनल मॉडल में संवादात्मक संदर्भ को शामिल करने के लाभों की भी जांच करते हैं। हमारे परिणामों से पता चलता है कि मॉडलिंग सूक्ष्म दुरुपयोग संभव है, लेकिन भाषा अत्यधिक सूक्ष्म और संदर्भ-संवेदनशील होने के कारण मुश्किल है। हम उम्मीद करते हैं कि क्षेत्र में भविष्य के शोध दुरुपयोग के ऐसे सूक्ष्म रूपों को संबोधित करेंगे क्योंकि उनका नुकसान वर्तमान में मौजूदा पहचान प्रणालियों के माध्यम से किसी का ध्यान नहीं जाता है।', 'ru': 'Оскорбительный язык в онлайн-дискурсе негативно влияет на большое количество пользователей социальных сетей. Для решения этой проблемы злоупотреблений в Интернете было предложено множество вычислительных методов. Вместе с тем в рамках текущей работы основное внимание уделяется выявлению более явных форм злоупотреблений, в результате чего более тонкие формы злоупотреблений остаются в значительной степени нетронутыми. Наша работа направлена на устранение этого пробела путем внесения трех основных взносов. Во-первых, вдохновляясь теорией невежливости, мы предлагаем новую задачу - выявить более тонкую форму злоупотреблений, а именно неприятные вопросы. Во-вторых, мы публикуем контекстно-ориентированный датасет для задачи, используя данные из разнообразного набора сообществ Reddit. В-третьих, мы реализуем широкий спектр моделей обучения, а также исследуем преимущества включения разговорного контекста в вычислительные модели. Наши результаты показывают, что моделирование тонких злоупотреблений осуществимо, но сложно из-за того, что используемые формулировки очень нюансированы и чувствительны к контексту. Мы надеемся, что будущие исследования в этой области помогут решить проблему таких тонких форм злоупотреблений, поскольку их вред в настоящее время незаметно проходит через существующие системы обнаружения.', 'ga': 'Bíonn tionchar diúltach ag teanga maslach sa dioscúrsa ar líne ar líon mór úsáideoirí na meán sóisialta. Tá go leor modhanna ríomhaireachta molta chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar cheist na mí-úsáide ar líne. Díríonn an obair atá ann faoi láthair, áfach, ar fhoirmeacha mí-úsáide níos soiléire a bhrath, rud a fhágann nach mbíonn baint ag na cineálacha mí-úsáide is míne. Tugann ár gcuid oibre aghaidh ar an mbearna seo trí chur isteach lárnach a dhéanamh. Ar an gcéad dul síos, spreagtha ag teoiric na hintiúlachta, molaimid tasc nua chun cineál mí-úsáide níos caolchúisí a bhrath, eadhon ceisteanna nach féidir a shásamh. Ar an dara dul síos, foilsímid tacar sonraí comhthéacs don tasc ag baint úsáide as sonraí ó thacar éagsúil de phobail Reddit. Ar an tríú dul síos, cuirimid raon leathan samhlacha foghlama i bhfeidhm agus fiosrímid freisin na buntáistí a bhaineann le comhthéacs comhrá a ionchorprú i múnlaí ríomhaireachtúla. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí go bhfuil samhaltú mí-úsáide caolchúiseach indéanta ach deacair mar gheall ar an teanga atá i gceist a bheith thar a bheith mionnaise agus comhthéacs-íogair. Tá súil againn go dtabharfaidh taighde sa réimse amach anseo aghaidh ar chineálacha mí-úsáide den sórt sin toisc nach dtugtar an dochar dóibh faoi láthair trí na córais braite atá ann cheana féin.', 'el': 'Η καταχρηστική γλώσσα στον διαδικτυακό διάλογο επηρεάζει αρνητικά μεγάλο αριθμό χρηστών των μέσων κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Έχουν προταθεί πολλές υπολογιστικές μέθοδοι για την αντιμετώπιση αυτού του ζητήματος της διαδικτυακής κατάχρησης. Η υπάρχουσα εργασία, ωστόσο, τείνει να επικεντρώνεται στην ανίχνευση των πιο σαφών μορφών κακοποίησης αφήνοντας τις λεπτότερες μορφές κακοποίησης σε μεγάλο βαθμό ανέγγιχτες. Το έργο μας αντιμετωπίζει αυτό το χάσμα κάνοντας τρεις βασικές συνεισφορές. Πρώτον, εμπνευσμένοι από τη θεωρία της αγένειας, προτείνουμε ένα νέο έργο ανίχνευσης μιας λεπτότερης μορφής κακοποίησης, δηλαδή δυσάρεστων ερωτήσεων. Δεύτερον, δημοσιεύουμε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων με επίγνωση του περιβάλλοντος για την εργασία χρησιμοποιώντας δεδομένα από ένα ποικίλο σύνολο κοινοτήτων. Τρίτον, εφαρμόζουμε ένα ευρύ φάσμα μαθησιακών μοντέλων και επίσης διερευνούμε τα οφέλη της ενσωμάτωσης του περιβάλλοντος συνομιλίας σε υπολογιστικά μοντέλα. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ότι η μοντελοποίηση της διακριτικής κακοποίησης είναι εφικτή αλλά δύσκολη, επειδή η γλώσσα που εμπλέκεται είναι ιδιαίτερα διαφοροποιημένη και ευαίσθητη στο πλαίσιο. Ελπίζουμε ότι η μελλοντική έρευνα στον τομέα αυτό θα αντιμετωπίσει τέτοιες λεπτές μορφές κατάχρησης, δεδομένου ότι η ζημία τους περνά επί του παρόντος απαρατήρητη μέσω των υφιστάμενων συστημάτων ανίχνευσης.', 'ka': 'ინტერნეტიკური დისკურსში ძალიან ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანი სოციალური მედია მომხმარებელი გააკეთებს. ბევრი კომპუტაციალური მეცოდები იყენებულია, რომ ამ პრობლემას ინტერნეტიური ძალიან გამოყენება. მაგრამ მსგავსი სამუშაო მუშაობაში, უფრო გამოიყენებული ფორმები ძალიან გამოიყენება, რომლებიც ძალიან გამოიყენებული გამოიყენება უფრო გამოიყენება. ჩვენი სამუშაო სამუშაო დამატებით ამ განსხვავებას, სამუშაო დამატებით. პირველად, ინტეპოლიციის თეორია, ჩვენ ახალგაზრდებით პრომენტის დავაკვირდებით სტუქტური ფორმა ძალიან დაკავშირებული კითხვები. მეორე, ჩვენ რედიტის საზოგადოებების განსხვავებული მონაცემების კონტექსტური მონაცემების სექტის გამოყენება. მესამე, ჩვენ განვიყენებთ სწავლის მოდელების უფრო დიდი რაოდენობა და ასევე განსხვავებთ კონტექსტური კონტექსტური მოდელში გადაყენება. ჩვენი წარმოდგენები გამოჩვენება, რომ მოდელირება სტრუქტური გამოყენება შესაძლებელია, მაგრამ ძალიან რთულია, რადგან საშუალებელი ენაზე იქნება ძალიან ძალია ნაეწგამვ ჟვ, ფვ ბყევღვრჲ თჱследованиვ გ ოჲლწრა ღვ ჟვ პაჱბვპვ ჟ რაკგთ ოპთლთფნთ ტჲპმთ ნა ნაოპაგთლჟრგჲრჲ, ჱაღჲრჲ რვჳნთრვ ნაპაეთ ჟვდა ოპვმთნარ ნვჲბჱნა', 'hu': 'A visszaélő nyelv az online diskurzusban negatívan befolyásolja számos közösségi média felhasználót. Számos számítástechnikai módszert javasoltak az online visszaélések problémájának kezelésére. A meglévő munka azonban a visszaélések kifejezettebb formáinak felderítésére összpontosít, amelyek nagyrészt érintetlenül hagyják a visszaélések finomabb formáit. Munkánk három alapvető hozzájárulással orvosolja ezt a hiányt. Először is, az udvariatlanság elméletéből inspirálva, egy új feladatot javasolunk a visszaélés finomabb formájának, nevezetesen a kielégíthetetlen kérdések felderítésére. Másodszor, egy kontextustudatos adatkészletet teszünk közzé a feladathoz a Reddit közösségek különböző adataiból. Harmadszor, a tanulási modellek széles skáláját alkalmazzuk, és megvizsgáljuk a beszélgetési kontextus számítási modellekbe való beépítésének előnyeit is. Eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy a finom visszaélések modellezése megvalósítható, de nehéz, mivel az érintett nyelv nagyon árnyalt és kontextusérzékeny. Reméljük, hogy a területen végzett jövőbeli kutatások a visszaélések ilyen finom formáival foglalkoznak, mivel károsodásuk jelenleg észrevétlenül áthalad a meglévő detektáló rendszereken.', 'mk': 'Абузивниот јазик во онлајн дискурсот негативно влијае на голем број корисници на социјалните медиуми. Многу компјутерски методи се предложени за решавање на ова прашање на онлајн злоупотреба. Сепак, постоечката работа има тенденција да се фокусира на откривањето на поексплицитните форми на злоупотреба, оставајќи ги суптилните форми на злоупотреба во голема мера недопрени. Нашата работа ја решава оваа празнина со тројца основни придонеси. Прво, инспирирано од теоријата на нељубезноста, предложуваме нова задача за откривање на посуптилна форма на злоупотреба, имено неразлични прашања. Второ, објавуваме набор на податоци свесни за контекст за задачата користејќи податоци од различни заедници на Reddit. Трето, спроведуваме широк број модели за учење и исто така ги истражуваме бенефициите од вклучувањето на контекстот во компјутерските модели. Нашите резултати покажуваат дека моделирањето на суптилните злоупотреби е остварливо, но тешко поради тоа што јазикот вклучен е многу нијансиран и контекстно чувствителен. We hope that future research in the field will address such subtle forms of abuse since their harm currently passes unnoticed through existing detection systems.', 'lt': 'Abusive language in online discourse negatively affects a large number of social media users.  Siekiant spręsti šį piktnaudžiavimo internetu klausimą, pasiūlyta daug skaičiavimo metodų. The existing work, however, tends to focus on detecting the more explicit forms of abuse leaving the subtler forms of abuse largely untouched.  Our work addresses this gap by making three core contributions.  First, inspired by the theory of impoliteness, we propose a novel task of detecting a subtler form of abuse, namely unpalatable questions.  Antra, skelbiame kontekste suprantamą duomenų rinkinį užduotims atlikti naudojant įvairių Reddit bendruomenių duomenų rinkinį. Third, we implement a wide array of learning models and also investigate the benefits of incorporating conversational context into computational models.  Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad smulkio piktnaudžiavimo modeliavimas yra įmanomas, bet sudėtingas, nes kalba yra labai nuancinga ir jautri kontekstui. Tikimės, kad būsimi moksliniai tyrimai šioje srityje padės spręsti tokias subtiles piktnaudžiavimo formas, nes jų žala šiuo metu nepastebima per esamas aptikimo sistemas.', 'ml': 'ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിലെ അബുസിവ് ഭാഷ നെറ്റിവേറ്റിയാണ് ഒരുപാട് സാമൂഹ്യ മീഡിയ ഉപയോക്താക് ഒരുപാട് കണക്കൂട്ടുണ്ടാക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d ഉപദ്രവിക്കുന്നതിനെ വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രാര നിലവിലുള്ള ജോലി എന്നാലും കൂടുതല്\u200d വ്യക്തമായ ഉപദ്രവങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്താന്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നുണ്ട്. അതിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട രീതികളില നമ്മുടെ ജോലി മൂന്നു മൂന്നു വർഷങ്ങളുണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഈ വ്യത്യാസവും വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന ആദ്യം, നിര്\u200dബന്ധമില്ലാത്ത തിയറിയാല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ജോലിയെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു, ഒരു ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ തരത്തില്\u200d നിന്ന്  രണ്ടാമതായി, നമ്മള്\u200d ജോലിയ്ക്ക് വേറെ വിവിധ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് റെഡിഡിറ്റ് സമൂഹത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും വിവരങ് മൂന്നാമത്, നമ്മള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ഒരു വിശിഷ്ടമായ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുകയും, കണക്കൂട്ടുണ്ടാക്കുന്ന മോഡലില്\u200d ക നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് സാധ്യതയുള്ള ഉപദ്രവങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് സാധ്യമല്ല എന്നാണ്, പക്ഷെ ഭാഷയില്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപെട നിലവിലുള്ള കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തിലൂടെ അവരുടെ ഉപദ്രവങ്ങള്\u200d നടന്നുപോകുമെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു.', 'kk': 'Интернеттегі дискурстардағы жеңіл тілдер көп социалдық медиа пайдаланушыларына негативен әсер етеді. Бұл онлайн жетістіктердің мәселесін шешу үшін көп есептеу әдістері ұсынылды. Бірақ барлық жұмыс істеген жұмыс көптеген жетістік түрлерін табуға көмектеседі. Көптеген жетістік түрлері көптеген жетістік түрлері көптеген. Жұмыс істеу үш негізгі көмектесу арқылы осы бос орындарды таңдайды. Біріншіден, белсенділік теориясынан түсіндірілген жаңа тапсырманы таңдаймыз, бұл жағдайда қорқыныштық сұрақтарды анықтау керек. Екіншіден, біз тапсырманың контексті түсінікті деректер жиынын басып шығармыз. Үшіншіден, біз көптеген оқыту үлгілерін орындап, мәліметті контексті компьютерлік үлгілеріне ендіру үшін мәліметтерді зерттейміз. Біздің нәтижелеріміз үлкен жетістіктерді моделдіру мүмкін, бірақ тілдерді көп жақсы және контекстік сезімдері өте қиын деп көрсетеді. Біз өрістегі болашақ зерттеулердің бұл жерде тәжірибелік тәртіптеріне шешуін үміттенеміз, өйткені олардың қауіпсіздігі барлық анықтау жүйелерімен білме', 'mt': "Abusive language in online discourse negatively affects a large number of social media users.  Many computational methods have been proposed to address this issue of online abuse.  Madankollu, ix-xogħol eżistenti għandu t-tendenza li jiffoka fuq l-iskoperta ta’ forom aktar espliċiti ta’ abbuż li jħallu l-forom aktar sottili ta’ abbuż fil-biċċa l-kbira tagħhom mingħajr tmiss. Our work addresses this gap by making three core contributions.  First, inspired by the theory of impoliteness, we propose a novel task of detecting a subtler form of abuse, namely unpalatable questions.  Second, we publish a context-aware dataset for the task using data from a diverse set of Reddit communities.  It-tielet, nimplimentaw firxa wiesgħa ta’ mudelli ta’ tagħlim u ninvestigaw ukoll il-benefiċċji tal-inkorporazzjoni tal-kuntest ta’ konverżjoni fil-mudelli tal-komputazzjoni. Ir-riżultati tagħna juru li l-immudellar tal-abbuż minuri huwa fattibbli iżda diffiċli minħabba li l-lingwa involuta hija nuanzata ħafna u sensittiva għall-kuntest. Nittamaw li r-riċerka futura fil-qasam se tindirizza forom minuri bħal dawn ta' abbuż peress li l-ħsara tagħhom bħalissa tgħaddi mingħajr ma tiġi nnotata permezz ta' sistemi eżistenti ta' individwazzjoni.", 'it': "Il linguaggio abusivo nel discorso online influisce negativamente su un gran numero di utenti dei social media. Molti metodi computazionali sono stati proposti per affrontare questo problema degli abusi online. Il lavoro esistente, tuttavia, tende a concentrarsi sulla rilevazione delle forme più esplicite di abuso lasciando in gran parte intatte le forme più sottili di abuso. Il nostro lavoro risolve questa lacuna apportando tre contributi fondamentali. In primo luogo, ispirandosi alla teoria della maleducazione, proponiamo un nuovo compito di individuare una forma più sottile di abuso, vale a dire domande sgradevoli. In secondo luogo, pubblichiamo un set di dati contestuale per l'attività utilizzando dati provenienti da un insieme diversificato di comunità Reddit. In terzo luogo, implementiamo una vasta gamma di modelli di apprendimento e analizziamo anche i vantaggi di incorporare il contesto conversazionale nei modelli computazionali. I nostri risultati mostrano che modellare abusi sottili è fattibile ma difficile a causa del linguaggio coinvolto che è altamente sfumato e sensibile al contesto. Ci auguriamo che la futura ricerca in questo campo affronti tali sottili forme di abuso poiché il loro danno passa inosservato attraverso i sistemi di rilevamento esistenti.", 'ms': 'Bahasa yang mengganggu dalam bahasa online mempengaruhi negatif bilangan besar pengguna media sosial. Many computational methods have been proposed to address this issue of online abuse.  The existing work, however, tends to focus on detecting the more explicit forms of abuse leaving the subtler forms of abuse largely untouched.  Our work addresses this gap by making three core contributions.  Pertama, terinspirasi oleh teori ketidaksopanan, kami cadangkan tugas baru untuk mengesan bentuk penyalahgunaan yang lebih halus, iaitu soalan yang tidak dapat diterima. Kedua, kami menerbitkan set data yang sedar-konteks untuk tugas menggunakan data dari kumpulan Reddit yang berbeza. Third, we implement a wide array of learning models and also investigate the benefits of incorporating conversational context into computational models.  Our results show that modeling subtle abuse is feasible but difficult due to the language involved being highly nuanced and context-sensitive.  Kami harap penyelidikan masa depan di lapangan akan mengatasi bentuk penyalahgunaan halus seperti ini kerana kerosakan mereka sekarang melalui sistem pengesan yang ada.', 'mn': 'Интернет ярианд хүчирхийллэг хэл нь нийгмийн хэвлэлийн хэрэглэгчид маш их нөлөөлдөг. Ихэнх тооны арга нь онлайн зөрчилдөөний асуудлыг зохицуулахын тулд санал өгсөн. Гэхдээ суурь байгаа ажил нь илүү тодорхой хэрэглээний хэлбэрийг олж мэдэхэд анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Бидний ажлын ажил гурван үндсэн нөлөөлөлт хийснээр энэ ялгааг илтгэдэг. Эхлээд, буруутгагүй байдлын онолын урам зорилгодог, бид илүү дорой зөрчилдөөний хэлбэрийг олж мэдэх шинэ даалгавар гаргадаг. Хоёр дахь, бид өөр өөр олон Reddit нийгмийн өгөгдлийг ашиглаж ажлын тухай мэдээллийн өгөгдлийн санг нийлүүлнэ. Гурав дахь, бид маш олон суралцах загваруудыг суралцаж, мөн харилцааны тооны загваруудыг тооцоолон загвар руу оруулахын тулд судалж байна. Бидний үр дүнд суурь хүчирхийллийг загварчлах нь боломжтой, гэхдээ хэл нь маш хэцүү боловч байдал сэтгэл хөдлөлтэй байдаг. Бид салбарт ирээдүйн судалгаагаар ийм хүчирхийллийн хэлбэртэй хэрэглээний тухай ярилцах гэж найдаж байна. Учир нь тэдний халдвар одоо оршин байгаа шийдвэрлэлийн системээс анзааргүй байдаг.', 'pl': 'Nadużywanie języka w dyskursie online negatywnie wpływa na dużą liczbę użytkowników mediów społecznościowych. Proponowano wiele metod obliczeniowych, aby rozwiązać problem nadużyć online. Dotychczasowe prace koncentrują się jednak na wykrywaniu bardziej wyraźnych form nadużyć, pozostawiając subtelniejsze formy nadużyć w dużej mierze nietknięte. Nasza praca rozwiązuje tę lukę, wnosząc trzy główne wkłady. Po pierwsze, inspirowane teorią niegrzeczności, proponujemy nowatorskie zadanie wykrywania subtelniejszej formy nadużyć, a mianowicie nieprzyjemnych pytań. Po drugie, publikujemy kontekstowy zestaw danych dla zadania wykorzystując dane z różnorodnego zestawu społeczności Reddit. Po trzecie, wdrażamy szeroki wachlarz modeli uczenia się, a także badamy korzyści płynące z włączenia kontekstu konwersacyjnego do modeli obliczeniowych. Nasze wyniki pokazują, że modelowanie subtelnych nadużyć jest możliwe, ale trudne ze względu na to, że język jest wysoce niuansowany i wrażliwy na kontekst. Mamy nadzieję, że przyszłe badania w tej dziedzinie zajmą się takimi subtelnymi formami nadużyć, ponieważ ich szkody obecnie przechodzą niezauważone przez istniejące systemy wykrywania.', 'ro': 'Limbajul abuziv în discursul online afectează negativ un număr mare de utilizatori ai rețelelor sociale. Multe metode de calcul au fost propuse pentru a aborda această problemă a abuzului online. Cu toate acestea, lucrarea existentă tinde să se concentreze pe detectarea formelor mai explicite de abuz lăsând formele mai subtile de abuz în mare parte neatinse. Activitatea noastră abordează acest decalaj prin aducerea a trei contribuții esențiale. În primul rând, inspirat de teoria nepoliticii, propunem o sarcină nouă de detectare a unei forme mai subtile de abuz, și anume întrebări neplăcute. În al doilea rând, publicăm un set de date conștient de context pentru sarcină folosind date dintr-un set divers de comunități Reddit. În al treilea rând, implementăm o gamă largă de modele de învățare și, de asemenea, investigăm beneficiile încorporării contextului conversațional în modele computaționale. Rezultatele noastre arată că modelarea abuzului subtil este fezabilă, dar dificilă datorită limbajului implicat fiind foarte nuanțat și sensibil la context. Sperăm că cercetările viitoare în domeniu vor aborda astfel de forme subtile de abuz, deoarece prejudiciul lor trece neobservat prin sistemele de detectare existente.', 'si': 'අන්ලයින් කතාවයේ අපරාධ භාෂාවක් සාමාජික මිඩියාව භාවිතාවක් ගොඩක් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරතිකාර කර ගොඩක් පරිගණනය විධානය සැලසුම් කරලා තියෙන්නේ අන්ලයින් විශ්වාස කරන්න. ඒත් තියෙන්නේ වැඩේ විශ්වාස කරන්නේ විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පරික්ෂා කරන්න. අපේ වැඩේ මේ අවස්ථාවක් ලැබෙනවා මුළු කාරණාවක් තුනක් වෙනුවෙන්. මුලින්, නිර්භීතයේ සිද්ධාවයෙන් ප්\u200dරේෂණය කරනවා, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන්න. දෙවෙනි විදියට, අපි රෙඩිට් සමාජිකයෙන් විවිදියට තොරතුරු භාවිත කරනවා කාර්යයෙන් සැකසුම් සඳහා ප්\u200d තුන්වෙනි විදියට, අපි ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා සහ පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පරීක්ෂණයේ පරීක්ෂණ ම අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ මොඩිල් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් නමුත් භාෂාවට අමාරුයි විශ්වාස කරන්න සහ සංවේද අපි බලාපොරොත්තු වෙන්නේ අනාගතයේ පරීක්ෂණය මේ ප්\u200dරදේශයේ අනාගතයේ අනාගතයෙන් මෙච්චර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරයි කියලා', 'sr': 'Abuzivni jezik u online diskusiji negativno utiče na veliki broj korisnika društvenih medija. Mnoge računalne metode su predložene da riješimo ovaj problem o zloupotrebi na internetu. Međutim, postojeći rad je tendencija da se fokusira na otkrivanje jasnijih oblika zlostavljanja, ostavljajući suptilnije oblike zlostavljanja u velikoj meri. Naš rad rješava tu prazninu donošenjem tri osnovne doprinosa. Prvo, inspirisan teorijom nesposobnosti, predlažemo novi zadatak otkrivanja suptilnijeg oblika zlostavljanja, a to je neplaćenih pitanja. Drugo, objavljujemo kompleks podataka za zadatak koji koristi podatke iz različitih skupina Reddit zajednica. Treće, implementiramo širok niz modela učenja i istražujemo koristi uključenja razgovornog konteksta u računalne modele. Naši rezultati pokazuju da je modeliranje suptilnog zlostavljanja moguće, ali teško zbog jezika uključenog da je vrlo nuancirano i osjetljivo u kontekstu. Nadamo se da će buduće istraživanje na terenu riješiti takve suptilne oblike zlostavljanja jer njihova šteta trenutno prolazi nepoznato kroz postojeće sustave detektiva.', 'so': "Hadalka shabakadda ee luqada ku saabsan waxey ku saameysaa isticmaalayaal badan oo shabakada bulshada. Waxaa loo talo galay qaabab badan oo xisaab ah in ay ka baaraandegaan arimahan isticmaalka internetka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee shaqada la joogo waxey ku kalsoonaadaan in uu ogaado noocyo cadcad oo isticmaal ah, waxayna ka tagaan noocyo dhaawac ah oo isticmaalka hoose ah. Shaqo-keentayadu wuxuu ku habboonayaa fursad saddex qayb oo kooban. Marka ugu horeysa, waxaa laguugu soo dhiibay fikrada aan caqli lahayn, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa shaqada warqada ah si aan loo ogaano nooca isticmaalka, kuwaas oo ah su'aalo aan la filayn. Second, waxaynu u soo daabacnaa macluumaad-aqoon ah oo shaqada lagu isticmaalayo macluumaad kala duduwan kooxo Reddit. Saddexda, waxaynu sameeynaa tusaalooyin waxbarasho oo ballaadhan, waxaana sidoo kale baaraynaa manfacyada laga soo geliyo muusikada xisaabta. Sababyadayada waxaa tusinaya in isticmaalka isticmaalka fudud waa suurtagal, laakiin waa adag in luqada la xiriirayo si aad looga fududeeyo islamarkaasna aad u dhaqdhaqaaqsan karo. Waxaan rajaynaynaa in baaritaanka mustaqbalka ee duurka lagu baaraandegayo noocyo cayiman oo isticmaalaya, sababtoo ah dhibaatooyinkoodu hada u baahan yihiin nidaamka baaritaanka.", 'sv': 'Missbruk av språk i onlinediskurs påverkar ett stort antal användare av sociala medier negativt. Många beräkningsmetoder har föreslagits för att ta itu med denna fråga om onlinemissbruk. Det befintliga arbetet tenderar dock att fokusera på att upptäcka de mer explicita former av missbruk som lämnar de mer subtila formerna av missbruk till stor del orörda. Vårt arbete tar itu med denna lucka genom att ge tre centrala bidrag. För det första, inspirerad av teorin om oförskämdhet, föreslår vi en ny uppgift att upptäcka en subtilare form av missbruk, nämligen obehagliga frågor. För det andra publicerar vi en kontextmedveten datauppsättning för uppgiften med hjälp av data från en mängd olika Reddit-grupper. För det tredje implementerar vi ett brett utbud av inlärningsmodeller och undersöker också fördelarna med att integrera konversationskontext i beräkningsmodeller. Våra resultat visar att modellering av subtil missbruk är möjlig men svårt eftersom språket är mycket nyanserat och kontextkänsligt. Vi hoppas att framtida forskning inom området kommer att ta itu med sådana subtila former av missbruk eftersom deras skada för närvarande passerar obemärkt genom befintliga detektionssystem.', 'ta': 'ஆன்லைன் பேச்சில் உள்ள மொழியை எதிர்மறையாக பாதிக்கும் பல சமூக ஊடக பயனீட்டாளர்களை பாதிக்கும். பல கணக்கீட்டு முறைமைகள் இந்த முறையை தேர்ந்தெடுக்க பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது. இருக்கும் வேலை, எனினும், மிகவும் வெளிப்படையான தீவிரவாத வடிவங்களை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் போது கவனம் செலுத்துகிறது, மிகவும் தீவிரமான ம எங்கள் வேலை இந்த இடைவெளியை மூன்று மூல பங்குகளை செய்து முகவரிக்கிறது. முதலில், நாங்கள் ஒரு புதிய பணியை கண்டுபிடிக்க நினைவூட்டுகிறோம், ஒரு துணை கேள்விகள் இல்லாத கேள்விகளை கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்காக. Second, we publish a context-aware dataset for the task using data from a diverse set of Reddit communities.  Third, we implement a wide array of learning models and also investigate the benefits of incorporating conversational context into computational models.  முடிவு நாங்கள் நம்புகிறோம் புலத்தில் எதிர்கால ஆராய்ச்சி இத்தகைய சிறிய முறையான abuse வடிவங்களை பேசும் என்று நம்புகிறேன் ஏனெனி', 'ur': 'آنلاین کی گفتگو میں ناپسند زبان بہت سے سوسیل میڈیا کارساز پر اثر دیتی ہے۔ بہت سی کمپیوٹریشن طریقے پیشنهاد کیے گئے ہیں کہ اس مسئلہ کو آنلاین مزاحمت کے بارے میں بحث کریں۔ لیکن موجود کام کی توقع یہ ہے کہ زیادہ واضح مزاحمت کے فرموں کا اظہار کرنا چاہے اور زیادہ مزاحمت کے فرموں کو چھوڑ دیں۔ ہمارا کام اس فاصلہ کے ذریعے تین بنیادی اضافہ کرنے کے ذریعے سمجھتا ہے۔ پہلے، بے حیائی کی نظریہ سے الهام کیا گیا ہے، ہم ایک نئی کام پیش کریں گے کہ ایک زیادہ زیادہ مزاحمت کی شکل پڑھیں، یعنی بغیر قابل سوال. دوسرا، ہم اس کام کے لئے ایک کنٹیسٹ آگاہ ڈیٹ سٹ کو ایک مختلف مجموعہ سے ڈیٹ کے استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ تیسری، ہم نے ایک گھیری سیکھنے کی مدل کی ایک جماعت کی عملہ کر دی ہے اور اس کے ساتھ کامپیوتروں کی کنٹنسیٹ کو کامپیوتروں کی مدل میں شامل کرنے کے فائدہ بھی تحقیق کر رہے ہیں. ہمارے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ نمائندگی زیادہ مزاحمت ہے لیکن اس زبان کی وجہ سے بہت مشکل ہے کہ بہت زیادہ مزاحمت اور متوسط حساس ہے ہم امید رکھتے ہیں کہ ملک میں مستقبل تحقیقات ایسی مصیبت کے فرموں سے استعمال کرے گا کیونکہ ان کا نقصان اکثر موجود پہچان سیستموں کے ذریعے غیر مشاهده ہوتا ہے.', 'no': 'Abusive språk i nettdiskursar påvirkar negativt mange sosiale mediebarbrukarar. Mange datamaskinemetodar er foreslått for å handtera dette problemet med bruk på nettverket. Det eksisterande arbeidet har imidlertid tendens å fokusera på å oppdaga dei meir eksplisiserte formane av bruk som forlater dei underformane av bruk i stort grad. Arbeidet vårt adresserer denne mellomroma ved å gjera tre kjernebidrag. Først, inspirert av teorien om impolitets, foreslår vi eit nytt oppgåve om å finna ein subter form av misbruk, som er uventa spørsmål. Andre, vi publiserer ein datasett for kontekstvare for oppgåva med data frå ein ulike sett av Reddit-fellesskap. Tredje, vi implementerer ein brei rekkjefølgje læringsmodeller og også undersøker fordelene til å inkludere konversjonskontekst i datamaskinermodeller. Resultatet våre viser at modellering av subtilbruk er feilig, men vanskeleg på grunn av språket som involverer er svært nuancert og kontekstsensitiv. Vi håper at framtidige forskning i feltet vil adressera slike subtil formar av bruk sidan skaden sine gjer nå uventa gjennom eksisterande oppdagingssystemer.', 'vi': 'Những ngôn ngữ lạm dụng trên mạng ảnh hưởng tiêu cực đến một số người dùng mạng. Nhiều phương pháp tính to án đã được đề xuất để giải quyết vấn đề lạm dụng trực tuyến. Tuy nhiên, công việc hiện có xu hướng tập trung vào việc phát hiện các hình thức lạm dụng rõ ràng hơn để tránh các hình thức lờ mờ của lạm dụng. Công việc của chúng tôi giải quyết vấn đề này bằng ba đóng góp cốt lõi. Trước hết, dựa trên lý thuyết bất lịch, chúng tôi đề nghị một nhiệm vụ mới là tìm ra một dạng lờ mờ của lạm dụng, đó là những câu hỏi không thể ngăn chặn. Thứ hai, chúng tôi công bố một tập tin nhận diện ngữ cảnh cho nhiệm vụ bằng cách sử dụng dữ liệu từ các cộng đồng Reddit khác nhau. Thứ ba, chúng tôi tạo ra một loạt các mô hình học tập và cũng nghiên cứu lợi ích của việc ghép bối cảnh đối thoại vào các mô hình tính toán. Những kết quả của chúng ta cho thấy việc mô phỏng lạm dụng tinh tế là khả thi nhưng khó khăn vì ngôn ngữ của chúng ta rất khác biệt và nhạy cảm. Chúng tôi hy vọng nghiên cứu tương lai sẽ giải quyết những loại lạm dụng tinh tế như vậy, vì những tổn thương của chúng hiện giờ không được chú ý qua qua qua qua hệ thống phát hiện hiện hiện.', 'uz': "Onlayn suhbat tilidagi foydalanuvchilarga ko'pchilik jamiyati foydalanuvchiga yetardi. @ info: whatsthis Ammo, mavjud vazifa ko'proq misol turlarini aniqlashga foydalanishiga qaramaydi, juda ko'proq misfoydalanuvchi shakllarini ko'rsatadi. Bizning ishimiz bu gapni uchta ko'paydo qilish orqali o'zgartiradi. First, inspired by the theory of impoliteness, we propose a novel task of detecting a subtler form of abuse, namely unpalatable questions.  Ikkinchi so'zda, biz vazifani bir nechta Reddit jamiyatlardan maʼlumot yordamida bajaramiz. Uchinchi, biz o'rganish modellarini ko'p ko'plab bajaramiz va yana bir talab muvaffaqiyatlarni kompyuter modellariga qo'shish imkoniyatini o'rganish imkoniyatlarini o'rganamiz. Bizning natijalarimizni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, lekin tilning juda katta nuqta va context-sensitive tili sababda juda qiyin. Biz shunday ishlayotganda kelajakda o'rganishni ishlatmaymiz, bu juda kichkina misfoydalanuvchi shakllarni boshqaradi, chunki hozirgi ular mavjud qidirish tizimlari orqali hech qachon narsa yo'q.", 'bg': 'Злоупотребяващият език в онлайн дискурса влияе негативно на голям брой потребители на социалните медии. Много изчислителни методи са предложени за решаване на този проблем с онлайн злоупотребата. Съществуващата работа обаче е насочена към откриване на по-ясните форми на злоупотреба, оставяйки по-фините форми на злоупотреба до голяма степен недокоснати. Нашата работа преодолява тази пропаст, като прави три основни приноса. Първо, вдъхновени от теорията за неучтивостта, предлагаме нова задача за откриване на по-тънка форма на злоупотреба, а именно неприятни въпроси. Второ, публикуваме набор от данни, съобразен с контекста, за задачата, използвайки данни от разнообразен набор от общности в Редит. Трето, ние внедряваме широк набор от модели на обучение и също така изследваме ползите от включването на разговорен контекст в изчислителните модели. Нашите резултати показват, че моделирането на фини злоупотреби е осъществимо, но трудно, тъй като използваният език е силно нюансиран и чувствителен към контекста. Надяваме се, че бъдещите изследвания в областта ще разгледат такива фини форми на злоупотреба, тъй като вредата им понастоящем преминава незабелязана през съществуващите системи за откриване.', 'nl': 'Misbruikelijke taal in online discours beïnvloedt een groot aantal social media gebruikers negatief. Er zijn veel rekenmethoden voorgesteld om dit probleem van online misbruik aan te pakken. Het bestaande werk richt zich echter op het opsporen van de meer expliciete vormen van misbruik, waardoor de subtielere vormen van misbruik grotendeels onaangetast blijven. Ons werk pakt deze kloof aan door drie kernbijdragen te leveren. Ten eerste, geïnspireerd op de theorie van onbeleefdheid, stellen we een nieuwe taak voor om een subtielere vorm van misbruik op te sporen, namelijk onbeleefde vragen. Ten tweede publiceren we een contextbewuste dataset voor de taak met behulp van gegevens uit een diverse set Reddit communities. Ten derde implementeren we een breed scala aan leermodellen en onderzoeken we ook de voordelen van het opnemen van conversationele context in computermodellen. Onze resultaten tonen aan dat het modelleren van subtiel misbruik haalbaar maar moeilijk is omdat de betrokken taal zeer genuanceerd en contextgevoelig is. We hopen dat toekomstig onderzoek op dit gebied dergelijke subtiele vormen van misbruik zal aanpakken, aangezien hun schade momenteel onopgemerkt door bestaande detectiesystemen gaat.', 'da': 'Misbrugssprog i online diskurs påvirker negativt et stort antal brugere af sociale medier. Mange beregningsmetoder er blevet foreslået til at løse problemet med onlinemisbrug. Det eksisterende arbejde har imidlertid tendens til at fokusere på at afsløre de mere eksplicitte former for misbrug, der efterlader de mere subtile former for misbrug stort set uberørt. Vores arbejde afhjælper denne mangel ved at yde tre centrale bidrag. For det første, inspireret af teorien om uhøflighed, foreslår vi en ny opgave at opdage en mere subtil form for misbrug, nemlig uløselige spørgsmål. For det andet offentliggør vi et kontekstbevidst datasæt til opgaven ved hjælp af data fra en bred vifte af Reddit-fællesskaber. For det tredje implementerer vi en bred vifte af læringsmodeller og undersøger også fordelene ved at indarbejde konversationskontekst i beregningsmodeller. Vores resultater viser, at modellering af subtile misbrug er muligt, men vanskeligt, fordi sproget er meget nuanceret og kontekstfølsomt. Vi håber, at den fremtidige forskning på området vil tage fat på sådanne subtile former for misbrug, da deres skade i øjeblikket passerer ubemærket gennem eksisterende detektionssystemer.', 'hr': 'Nasilni jezik u online diskusiji negativno utječe na veliki broj korisnika društvenih medija. Mnoge računalne metode su predložene za rješavanje ovog pitanja zloupotrebe na internetu. Međutim, postojeći rad tendencija se usredotočiti na otkrivanje jasnijih oblika zlostavljanja, ostavljajući suptilnije oblike zlostavljanja u velikoj mjeri. Naš rad rješava tu prazninu donošenjem tri osnovne doprinosa. Prvo, inspirisan teorijom nepolitnosti, predlažemo novi zadatak otkrivanja suptilnijeg oblika zlostavljanja, a to je neplaćenih pitanja. Drugo, objavljujemo kompleks podataka za zadatak koji koristi podatke iz različitih skupina Reddit zajednica. Treće, provodimo širok niz modela učenja i istražujemo koristi uključenja razgovornog konteksta u računalne modele. Naši rezultati pokazuju da je modeliranje suptilnog zlostavljanja moguće ali teško jer je jezik uključen jako nuanciran i osjetljiv kontekst. Nadamo se da će buduće istraživanje na terenu riješiti takve suptilne oblike zlostavljanja jer njihova šteta trenutno prolazi nepoznato kroz postojeće sustave otkrivanja.', 'de': 'Missbrauchssprache im Online-Diskurs wirkt sich negativ auf eine große Anzahl von Social-Media-Nutzern aus. Viele Rechenmethoden wurden vorgeschlagen, um dieses Problem des Online-Missbrauchs anzugehen. Die vorliegende Arbeit konzentriert sich jedoch tendenziell darauf, die expliziteren Formen des Missbrauchs aufzudecken und die subtileren Formen des Missbrauchs weitgehend unberührt zu lassen. Unsere Arbeit schließt diese Lücke mit drei Kernbeiträgen. Zunächst schlagen wir, inspiriert von der Theorie der Unhöflichkeit, eine neue Aufgabe vor, eine subtilere Form von Missbrauch aufzudecken, nämlich unliebsame Fragen. Zweitens veröffentlichen wir einen kontextbezogenen Datensatz für die Aufgabe mit Daten aus einer Vielzahl von Reddit-Communities. Drittens implementieren wir eine breite Palette von Lernmodellen und untersuchen auch die Vorteile der Einbindung von Konversationskontext in computergestützte Modelle. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die Modellierung subtiler Missbrauchs machbar, aber schwierig ist, da die Sprache sehr nuanciert und kontextsensitiv ist. Wir hoffen, dass die künftige Forschung auf diesem Gebiet solche subtilen Formen des Missbrauchs adressieren wird, da ihr Schaden derzeit unbemerkt durch bestehende Erkennungssysteme geht.', 'id': 'Bahasa abusif dalam diskors online mempengaruhi negatif sejumlah besar pengguna media sosial. Many computational methods have been proposed to address this issue of online abuse.  Pekerjaan yang ada, bagaimanapun, cenderung untuk fokus pada mendeteksi bentuk penyalahgunaan yang lebih eksplisit meninggalkan bentuk penyalahgunaan yang lebih halus kebanyakan tidak tersentuh. Pekerjaan kita mengatasi kekacauan ini dengan membuat tiga kontribusi utama. Pertama, terinspirasi oleh teori ketidaksopanan, kami mengusulkan tugas baru untuk mendeteksi bentuk penyalahgunaan yang lebih halus, yaitu pertanyaan yang tidak dapat diterima. Kedua, kami mempublikasikan set data yang menyadari konteks untuk tugas menggunakan data dari set berbagai komunitas Reddit. Ketiga, kami menerapkan banyak model belajar dan juga menyelidiki keuntungan dari memasukkan konteks konversasi ke dalam model komputasi. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahwa model penyalahgunaan halus adalah feasible tapi sulit karena bahasa yang terlibat menjadi sangat nuansi dan konteks sensitif. Kami berharap penelitian masa depan di lapangan akan mengatasi bentuk penyalahgunaan halus seperti ini karena kerusakan mereka saat ini melewati tanpa diperhatikan melalui sistem deteksi yang ada.', 'sw': 'Lugha isiyo ya kibaguzi katika mazungumzo ya mtandaoni inaathiri watumiaji wengi wa mitandao ya kijamii. Tamko nyingi za kompyuta zimependekezwa kujadili suala hili la unyanyasaji wa mtandaoni. Kazi ya sasa, hata hivyo, inaelekea lengo la kutambua aina wazi zaidi ya matumizi ya unyanyasaji na kuacha aina ndogo ya matumizi ya unyanyasaji hayakugusa sana. Our work addresses this gap by making three core contributions.  Kwanza, tunahamasishwa na nadharia ya kutokuwepo upotofu, tunapendekeza jukumu la riwaya la kutambua aina ya unyanyasaji madogo, yaani maswali yasiyoeleweka. Pili, tunachapisha seti ya taarifa inayofahamika kwa kazi kwa kutumia taarifa kutoka kwenye jamii mbalimbali za Reddit. Tatu, tunatekeleza mifano mingi ya kujifunza na pia tunachunguza faida za kuingiza muktadha wa mazungumzo katika mifano ya hisabati. Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kuwa unyanyasaji mdogo unawezekana lakini ni vigumu kwa sababu ya lugha inayohusishwa na kuwa na umuhimu mkubwa na wenye umuhimu. Tunatumaini kwamba utafiti wa baadaye katika uwanja utazungumzia aina hizi za unyanyasaji vizuri tangu madhara yao kwa sasa yanapita bila kuchanganyikiwa kupitia mfumo wa kutambua uliopo.', 'ko': '인터넷 언어 중의 욕설 언어는 대량의 소셜 미디어 사용자에게 부정적인 영향을 미친다.사람들은 온라인 남용 문제를 해결하기 위해 많은 계산 방법을 제시했다.그러나 기존의 업무는 더욱 명확한 학대 형식을 검출하는 데 중심을 두었고 기본적으로 더 미묘한 학대 형식과 관련이 없다.우리의 업무는 세 가지 핵심 공헌을 통해 이 격차를 보완한다.우선, 예의 이론의 계발을 받아 우리는 더욱 미묘한 학대 형식, 즉 불쾌한 문제를 검출하는 새로운 임무를 제기했다.그 다음으로, 우리는 서로 다른 Reddit 커뮤니티의 데이터 발표 임무의 상하문 감지 데이터 집합을 사용합니다.셋째, 우리는 일련의 광범위한 학습 모델을 실현했고 회화의 언어 환경을 계산 모델에 포함시키는 장점을 연구했다.우리의 연구 결과에 의하면 미묘한 남용 행위에 대해 모델링을 하는 것은 가능하지만 관련된 언어는 고도의 미세한 차이와 상하문 민감성을 가지고 있기 때문에 모델링은 어렵다.우리는 기존의 검측 시스템이 현재 그들의 위해에 주의하지 않기 때문에 이 분야의 미래 연구가 이런 미묘한 학대 형식을 해결할 수 있기를 바란다.', 'tr': 'Çaltylyk gürrüňlerde Abusive dil sosial medýdançalaryň köp sanyny täsirleýär. Çaltylyk ýüzerläk meseleni çözmek üçin köp sanat yöntemleri teklip edildi. Ýöne meýdança işleýän işiň açyk täzeliklerini açmak üçin üns berilýär. Çalışmalarymyz üç esasy gabdalyk bilen bu gaplary çözýär. Ilkinji gezek, boýunçylyk teoriýasy tarapyndan esinlendirilen, biz özümizde alçak syýahat şeklinde täsirli soraglary tapmaklygyny täze bir täze täze teklip berýäris. Ikinjisi, biz bu zadyň üçin bir kontekst-bilinç veri setini Reddit jemgyýetinden üýtgeden çäreleri ulanýarys. Üçüncüsü, bir sürü öwrenme modellerini etkinleştirdik we sohbet kontekstlerini hesap modellerine dahil etmek üçin faydallaryny inceledik. Biziň netijelerimiz alçak hili ýitirmek mümkin däldir, ýöne dilleriň üstüne nusgalandygyny we daşyrymyz hasaplanýandygyny görkezýäris. Biz bu sahada gelejek araştyrmalaryň şeýle alyp barmagyny umyt edýäris, sebäbi olaryň urşanlary häzirki wagt hem bolan tanyş sistemalarynda tanyş edilmedikleri sebäpli.', 'af': "Abusive taal in online diskursie negatief afvloek 'n groot aantal sosiale media gebruikers. Baie rekenaar metodes is voorgestel om hierdie probleem van online misdaad te raak. Die bestaande werk, maar tendig om fokus te vind op die meer eksplisiese vorms van misbruk te laat verlaat die subtlere vorms van misbruk in groot manier nie. Ons werk adreseer hierdie afstand deur drie honderbidrag te maak. Eerste, inspireer deur die teorie van onvolledigheid, voorstel ons 'n nuwe taak om 'n ondersteunde vorm van onvolledigheid te ontdek, naamlik onverwagbare vrae. Tweede, ons publiseer 'n konteksbekende datastel vir die taak met gebruik van data van 'n verskeie stel van Reddit gemeenskappe. Tredde, ons implementeer 'n wye aantal van leer modele en ook die voordele van die inkorporeer van konversasionale konteks in rekenaar modele. Ons resultate wys dat modellering van subtel miskieding is moontlik, maar moeilik vanweë die taal wat die taal betrokke is, is baie nuanced en konteks-sensitief. Ons hoop dat toekomstige ondersoek in die veld sodanige subtiele vorms van miskiedenis sal adres, omdat hulle skade huidiglik verbygaan deur bestaande opdagingsstelsels onbekend.", 'sq': 'Abusive language in online discourse negatively affects a large number of social media users.  Shumë metoda kompjuterike janë propozuar për të trajtuar këtë çështje abuzimi në internet. The existing work, however, tends to focus on detecting the more explicit forms of abuse leaving the subtler forms of abuse largely untouched.  Puna jonë trajton këtë mungesë duke bërë tre kontribute thelbësore. Së pari, frymëzuar nga teoria e papërshtatshmërisë, ne propozojmë një detyrë të re për zbulimin e një forme më të butë abuzimi, veçanërisht pyetje të papërshtatshme. Second, we publish a context-aware dataset for the task using data from a diverse set of Reddit communities.  Së treti, ne zbatojmë një sërë të gjerë modelesh mësimi dhe gjithashtu hetojmë përfitimet e përfshirjes së kontekstit bisedimor në modelet llogaritarë. Rezultatet tona tregojnë se modelimi i abuzimit subtil është i realizueshëm por i vështirë për shkak se gjuha e përfshirë është shumë e nuancuar dhe e ndjeshme nga konteksti. Shpresojmë se kërkimi i ardhshëm në fushë do të trajtojë forme të tilla të buta abuzimi pasi dëmi i tyre kalon aktualisht pa vënë re nëpërmjet sistemeve ekzistuese zbulimi.', 'fa': 'زبان مزخرف در صحبت آنلاین منفی به تعداد بسیاری از کاربران رسانه اجتماعی تأثیر می\u200cدهد. روش\u200cهای محاسباتی بسیاری پیشنهاد داده شده است که این مسئله\u200cی تجاوز آنلاین را حل کند. ولی کار موجود است که روی پیدا کردن فرم\u200cهای مشخص\u200cتر از تجاوز، تمرکز می\u200cکند تا فرم\u200cهای زیر تجاوز را به اکثر اثر نداشته باشد. کارمون این فاصله را با توجه به سه تاثیر اصلی دریافت می\u200cکند. اول، توسط تئوری بی\u200cاعتماد الهام داده شده، ما یک کار نوی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که یک شکل زیر تجاوز، یعنی سوال بی\u200cپرداخته\u200cای را تشخیص دهیم. دوم، ما یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای آگاهی در کنترل برای این کار را با استفاده از داده\u200cها از مجموعه\u200cهای مختلف جامعه\u200cهای Reddit منتشر می\u200cکنیم. سوم، ما یک مجموعه وسیع مدل یادگیری را اجرا می\u200cکنیم و همچنین مفید\u200cهایی را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که محیط مکالمه\u200cهای مکالمه\u200cای در مدل\u200cهای کامپیوتری شامل می\u200cشود. نتیجه\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که نمونه\u200cسازی استفاده\u200cهای زیادی ممکن است ولی به دلیل زبانی که درگیر شده است سخت است و حساس\u200cهای زیادی است. ما امیدواریم تحقیقات آینده در این زمینه به چنین شکل مزخرف استفاده کند چون آسیب آنها در حال حاضر از طریق سیستم شناسایی موجود غیر مشاهده می شود.', 'hy': 'Abusive language in online discourse negatively affects a large number of social media users.  Many computational methods have been proposed to address this issue of online abuse.  The existing work, however, tends to focus on detecting the more explicit forms of abuse leaving the subtler forms of abuse largely untouched.  Our work addresses this gap by making three core contributions.  Առաջինը, ոգեշնչված անտարբերության տեսությունից, մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր խնդիր, որպեսզի հայտնաբերենք ավելի նուրբ չարաշահումների ձև, հատկապես անտարբեր հարցեր: Second, we publish a context-aware dataset for the task using data from a diverse set of Reddit communities.  Երրորդ, մենք իրականացնում ենք ուսուցման մոդելների լայն շարք և նաև ուսումնասիրում ենք խոսակցության կոնտեքստի ներառման առավելությունները հաշվարկման մոդելների մեջ: Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ նրբագեղ չարաշահումների մոդելավորումը հնարավոր է, բայց դժվար է, քանի որ ներառված լեզուն շատ նյուանսավոր է և կոնտեքստի զգայուն է: Մենք հույս ունենք, որ այս ոլորտում ապագա հետազոտությունները կլուծեն չարաշահումների նրբագեղ ձևերը, քանի որ դրանց վնասը ներկայումս աննկատելի է գոյություն ունեցող հայտնաբերման համակարգերի միջոցով:', 'am': 'በመንግሥት የቋንቋ ቋንቋ በብዙ ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ተጠቃሚዎችን ያጎድልበታል፡፡ Many computational methods have been proposed to address this issue of online abuse.  ነገር ግን የአሁኑ ሥራ በተጨማሪው የጥላቻ ዓይነቶች በተጨማሪው አካባቢ ጥቃት መግለጽ እየተዘጋጅተዋል፡፡ ሥራችን ሦስት የክፍለ አካል ማድረግ ነው፡፡ አስቀድሞ፣ የማይፈቃድ ታሪኮች፣ የጥላቻ መልክ ማግኘት አዲስ ስራ እናስቸጋራለን፡፡ Second, the context-aware data set for the task by using data from various Reddit communities. Third, we implement a wide array of learning models and also investigate the benefits of incorporating conversational context into computational models.  ፍጥረታችን አካባቢ ጥቃት መሆኑን ማሳየት የሚችል ነገር ግን ቋንቋ እጅግ አስቸጋሪ እና በሥርዓት ስህተት ማሳየት ነው፡፡ በሜዳ ውስጥ ያሉት የቀድሞው ምርመራ እንደዚህ ያሉ አካባቢ ዓይነት ጥቃት እንዲያቋርጥ ተስፋ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'az': 'İnternet dilində çox sosyal media istifadəçilərini negatif təsirləyir. İnternettə istifadə etmək məqsədilə bu məsələni çəkmək üçün çox hesap metodları təbliğ edilmişdir. Halbuki, mevcut işlər istifadə etmək üçün daha açıq formlarını təşkil etməyə məcburiyyət edir. Bizim işimiz bu boşluğu üç əsas qismət edərək çəkir. İlk dəfə, pislik teoriyasından ilham verilmiş, biz yeni bir iş təklif edirik ki, daha az pisliyi keçirmək, yani təklif edilməz suallar. İkincisi, müxtəlif Reddit cəmiyyətlərindən məlumatları istifadə edən məlumatlar üçün məlumatların məlumatlarını təbliğ edirik. Üçüncüsü, öyrənmək modellərinin çoxluğunu və həmçinin müzakirə məlumatlarını hesablama modellərinə qatmaq üçün istifadə edirik. Bizim sonuçlarımız modellərimizin azğınlıq istifadə edilməsi mümkün deyildir, amma dillərin çox çətin olduğu və məlumatların məlumatlarını hiss edir. Biz ümid edirik ki, sahədəki gələcək araştırmalar bu cür istifadə edəcəklər, çünki onların zərəri artıq məskənin keşfetmə sistemləri ilə dərk edilməz.', 'bs': 'Nasilni jezik u online diskusiji negativno utječe na veliki broj korisnika društvenih medija. Mnoge računalne metode su predložene za rješavanje ovog pitanja zlostavljanja na internetu. Međutim, postojeći rad se tendencija fokusirati na otkrivanje jasnijih oblika zlostavljanja, ostavljajući suptilne oblike zlostavljanja u velikoj mjeri. Naš rad rješava tu prazninu donošenjem tri osnovne doprinosa. Prvo, inspirisan teorijom nesposobnosti, predlažemo novi zadatak otkrivanja suptilnijeg oblika zlostavljanja, a to je neplaćenih pitanja. Drugo, objavljujemo kompleks podataka za zadatak koji koristi podatke iz različitih skupina Reddit zajednica. Treće, implementiramo širok niz modela učenja i istražujemo koristi uključenja razgovornog konteksta u računalne modele. Naši rezultati pokazuju da je modeliranje suptilnog zlostavljanja moguće, ali teško zbog jezika uključenog da je vrlo nuanciran i osjetljiv kontekst. Nadamo se da će buduće istraživanje na terenu riješiti takve suptilne oblike zlostavljanja jer njihova šteta trenutno prolazi nepoznato kroz postojeće sustave otkrivanja.', 'cs': 'Zneužívající jazyk v online diskurzu negativně ovlivňuje velký počet uživatelů sociálních médií. Pro řešení této problematiky zneužívání on-line bylo navrženo mnoho výpočetních metod. Stávající práce se však zaměřuje na odhalování explicitnějších forem zneužívání, které ponechávají jemnější formy zneužívání do značné míry nedotčené. Naše práce řeší tuto mezeru třemi hlavními příspěvky. Nejprve, inspirovaný teorií nezdvořilosti, navrhujeme nový úkol odhalit jemnější formu zneužívání, konkrétně nepříjemné otázky. Za druhé publikujeme kontextovou sadu dat pro daný úkol s využitím dat z různých komunit Reddit. Za třetí implementujeme širokou škálu vzdělávacích modelů a také zkoumáme výhody začlenění konverzačního kontextu do výpočetních modelů. Naše výsledky ukazují, že modelování jemného zneužívání je možné, ale obtížné, protože jazyk je vysoce nuancovaný a kontextově citlivý. Doufáme, že budoucí výzkum v této oblasti se bude zabývat těmito jemnými formami zneužívání, protože jejich škody v současné době procházejí bez povšimnutí stávajícími detekčními systémy.', 'et': 'Kuritarvitav keel internetidiskursuses mõjutab negatiivselt suurt hulka sotsiaalmeedia kasutajaid. Veebipõhise kuritarvitamise probleemi lahendamiseks on välja pakutud palju arvutusmeetodeid. Olemasolevas töös kiputakse aga keskenduma selgemate kuritarvitamisvormide avastamisele, jättes peenemad kuritarvitamisvormid suures osas puutumata. Meie töö lahendab selle lõhe kolme põhilise panuse kaudu. Esiteks, inspireerituna ebaviisakuse teooriast, pakume välja uue ülesande avastada peenema kuritarvitamise vorm, nimelt ebameeldivad küsimused. Teiseks avaldame ülesande jaoks kontekstiteadliku andmekogumi, kasutades erinevate Reddit kogukondade andmeid. Kolmandaks rakendame laia valikut õppemudeleid ja uurime ka vestluskonteksti kaasamise eeliseid arvutusmudelitesse. Meie tulemused näitavad, et peene kuritarvitamise modelleerimine on teostatav, kuid keel on väga nüansiline ja kontekstitundlik. Loodame, et tulevased uuringud selles valdkonnas käsitlevad selliseid peeneid kuritarvitamise vorme, sest nende kahju jääb praegu olemasolevate tuvastamissüsteemide kaudu märkamatuks.', 'bn': 'অনলাইন কথোপকথনে অভিবাসী ভাষা নেতিবাচকভাবে বিশাল সামাজিক মিডিয়া ব্যবহারকারীদের প্রভাব ফেলেছে। অনলাইন নির্যাতনের ব্যাপারে প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে। তবে বিদ্যমান কাজের প্রতি মনোযোগ দিচ্ছে যে বেশী পরিস্কারভাবে নির্যাতনের ধরনের নির্যাতনের ব্যাপারে বেশি পরিস্কার করে দেখা যায়,  আমাদের কাজ তিনটি মূল অংশগ্রহণের মাধ্যমে এই বিভ্রান্তির কথা বলেছে। প্রথমত, নির্যাতনের তত্ত্ব দ্বারা অনুপ্রাণিত হয়েছে, আমরা একটি উপন্যাসের কাজ প্রস্তাব করেছি যেখানে নির্যাতনের কোন ধরনের নির্যা দ্বিতীয়, আমরা কাজের জন্য একটি কন্টেক্সট- সচেতন ডাটাসেট প্রকাশ করি রেডিডিট সম্প্রদায়ের বিভিন্ন ধরনের তথ্য ব্ তৃতীয়, আমরা শিক্ষা মোডেল ব্যবস্থা করি এবং গণমূল মডেলে যোগাযোগ করার সুবিধা অনুসন্ধান করি। আমাদের ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে মডেলিং নির্যাতন অসম্ভব কিন্তু ভাষার সাথে জড়িত ভাষার কারণে অত্যন্ত বিচ্ছিন্ন এবং প্রেক্ We hope that future research in the field will address such subtle forms of abuse since their harm currently passes unnoticed through existing detection systems.', 'fi': 'Väärinkäyttökielto verkkodiskurssissa vaikuttaa kielteisesti moniin sosiaalisen median käyttäjiin. Verkkoväärinkäytön ratkaisemiseksi on ehdotettu useita laskennallisia menetelmiä. Nykyisessä työssä keskitytään kuitenkin havaitsemaan selkeämmät väärinkäytön muodot, jotka jättävät hienovaraisemmat väärinkäytön muodot pitkälti koskemattomiksi. Työmme korjaa tätä aukkoa tekemällä kolme keskeistä panosta. Ensinnäkin epäkohteliaisuuden teorian innoittamana ehdotamme uutta tehtävää havaita hienovaraisempi väärinkäytön muoto, nimittäin epämiellyttäviä kysymyksiä. Toiseksi julkaisemme tehtävään kontekstitietoisen aineiston, jossa hyödynnetään tietoa erilaisista Reddit-yhteisöistä. Kolmanneksi toteutamme laajan valikoiman oppimismalleja ja tutkimme myös keskustelukontekstin sisällyttämisen hyötyjä laskennallisiin malleihin. Tuloksemme osoittavat, että hienovaraisen väärinkäytön mallintaminen on mahdollista, mutta vaikeaa, koska kieli on hyvin vivahteinen ja kontekstitunnisti herkkä. Toivomme, että alan tulevassa tutkimuksessa puututaan tällaisiin hienovaraisiin väärinkäytösten muotoihin, koska niiden haittoja ei tällä hetkellä huomata olemassa olevien tunnistusjärjestelmien kautta.', 'ca': "El llenguatge abusiv en el discurs on-line afecta negativament a un gran nombre d'usuaris dels mitjans socials. Many computational methods have been proposed to address this issue of online abuse.  The existing work, however, tends to focus on detecting the more explicit forms of abuse leaving the subtler forms of abuse largely untouched.  La nostra feina aborda aquest buit fent tres contribucions essencials. First, inspired by the theory of impoliteness, we propose a novel task of detecting a subtler form of abuse, namely unpalatable questions.  Second, we publish a context-aware dataset for the task using data from a diverse set of Reddit communities.  En tercer lloc, implementem una gran varietat de models d'aprenentatge i també investigam els beneficis d'incorporar el contexte conversacional en models computacionals. Our results show that modeling subtle abuse is feasible but difficult due to the language involved being highly nuanced and context-sensitive.  We hope that future research in the field will address such subtle forms of abuse since their harm currently passes unnoticed through existing detection systems.", 'sk': 'Zloraba jezika v spletnem diskurzu negativno vpliva na veliko število uporabnikov družbenih medijev. Za reševanje tega vprašanja spletne zlorabe so bile predlagane številne računalniške metode. Vendar se obstoječe delo osredotoča na odkrivanje bolj eksplicitnih oblik zlorab, ki v veliki meri ostanejo nedotaknjene. Naše delo odpravlja to vrzel s tremi ključnimi prispevki. Najprej, navdihnjeno s teorijo nevljudnosti, predlagamo novo nalogo odkrivanja subtilnejše oblike zlorabe, namreč neprijetnih vprašanj. Drugič, objavljamo kontekstno ozaveščen nabor podatkov za nalogo z uporabo podatkov iz različnih skupnosti Reddit. Tretjič, uvajamo širok nabor učnih modelov in raziskujemo prednosti vključevanja pogovornega konteksta v računalniške modele. Naši rezultati kažejo, da je modeliranje subtilne zlorabe izvedljivo, vendar težko, saj je jezik zelo niansiran in kontekstno občutljiv. Upamo, da bodo prihodnje raziskave na tem področju obravnavale tako subtilne oblike zlorab, saj njihova škoda trenutno neopažena prek obstoječih sistemov odkrivanja.', 'ha': "Lugha da bakwai cikin magana masu shawara a kan kwamfyutan, yana shagala masu yawa ga masu amfani da mitandai na jamii. An goyya da wasu hanyoyin lissafi dõmin su address wannan masu zartar da abun akwatin Online. Kayan aiki da ke gaba, ko da yaushe, yana fokus a kan gane zaɓani masu bayyani na abun, kuma yana barin tsarin abun da suka yi ƙari ba. Kaimarmu yana tambayar wannan gap da za'a sami mataimaki uku. Kayyan, da aka yi wahayi da idãnar da ba'a zartar da shi ba, sai mu buƙata wani aikin nan da za'a gane wani irin abuni na dabar-dabar, ko da wasu maswali da bã za'a yi sauna ba. Dukkan, muna nuna wani tsarin da ke gaya wa aikin da za'a yi amfani da data daga wasu jama'a na Rededit. na ukunsa, Munã samar da wasu misãlai masu bara kuma suna jãyayya amfani da za'a shigar da mazaɓa da mazaɓa zuwa misãlai na lissafa. MatamayinMu na nũna cewa misalin misalin mai sauri ne mai iya amfani, kuma amma mai tsanani ne sabõda harshen wanda ke haɗa da shi mai tsawo da kuma an sami da muhimmin mai sauri. Munã kwaɗayin cẽwa, ƙidãyayyuta masu ƙaranci a cikin birnin zai yi magana da wasu irin abubuwa masu rauni, kwani damayensu a yanzu ta shũɗe ba da amfani da na'ura masu gane.", 'he': 'Abusive language in online discourse negatively affects a large number of social media users.  Many computational methods have been proposed to address this issue of online abuse.  העבודה הנוכחית, בכל אופן, נוטה להתמקד בלגלות צורות התעללות יותר ברורות, משאיר את צורות התעללות העדינות יותר בלתי נגעות בעיקר. העבודה שלנו מתמודדת עם הפער הזה על ידי לעשות שלושה תרומות ליבה. ראשית, בהשראה מהתיאוריה של חסר הצדק, אנו מציעים משימה חדשה לגלות צורה עדינה יותר של התעללות, כלומר שאלות בלתי אפשריות. שנית, אנחנו פורסמים קבוצת נתונים מודעת לקשר למשימה באמצעות נתונים מגוונים של קהילות רדיט. שלישית, אנו מפעילים מגוון רחב של דוגמנים ללמוד וגם חוקרים את היתרונות של הכילוי הקשר השיחתי לדוגמנים מחשביים. התוצאות שלנו מראות שמדגם התעללות עדינות אפשרי אבל קשה בגלל השפה המעורבת להיות ניאונציה גבוהה וחושבת בקשר. אנו מקווים שמחקר עתיד בשטח יתייחס לצורות עדינות כאלה של התעללות מאחר שהנזק שלהם עובר כרגע ללא שמה לב דרך מערכות גילוי קיימות.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk ning resmi online, iso nggawe akeh online, nik akeh liyane sak popularan media ssosi. Laptop" and "Desktop Awak dhéwé, nggonani uwong mesthi apakno kanggo kehidakno ngerasakno apakno. Genjer-genjer jabarang langkung wigat iki dadi tanggal 3 Awak dhéwé, luwih-luwih lan theori sing perduhal kuwi, kéné gunakake télah lan mbukakipun kaendahing pangutan alé, ngono nggawe nguasakno sing apik dhéwé. Sampeyan, kita ngubah data set kontext-Awak kanggo nggawe task gambar data sistem sing ngewehi sistem sing nguasai komunitas Redit Genjer-Genjer Rejalaké awak dhéwé menehi ngomong nik akeh operasi tarjamahan kanggo ngerasakno karo akeh ujian sing menehi kuwi nggolok tarjamahan lan susahe kontèks-susahe. Awak dhéwé ngerasah barêng-barêng langgar nêmên iki dadi iki bakal gadoh ing larang kanggo kalab winih dhéwé kuwi ngêwèké perusahaan kanggo ngerasakno sistem detecti iki.', 'bo': 'དྲ་བ་དང་ཐོག་ཏུ་Abusive language in discourse negatively affects a large number of social media users. རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་དྲ་རྒྱའི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་འདི་ལ་བསླབ་སྤྲོད་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་དེ་ལ་དམིགས་གཏོང་ནུས་པ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་རྙེད་སྤྲོད་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་ལ་བར་སྟོང་འདི་ལ་དབྱིབས་གྱི་ཁུངས་ལ་གསུམ་ཀྱི་ཁུངས་གཏོང་ཡོད་པ་ཡིན། དང་པོ་དེ། དུས་འདང་བློ་གཏོང་མེད་པའི་གཞི་ཚུལ་ལུགས་ཀྱིས་ང་ཚོས་གསར་གཏོང་གི་བྱ་ཚིག་རྟོགས་ཐུབ་པ་ཞིག་དང་། གཉིས་པ། ང་ཚོས་བློ་གཏོང་ཆེད་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་དང་ཁོང་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག གསུམ་པ་བརྗོད་མའི་ནང་དུ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྦྲེལ་བའི་མ་དཔེ་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིག་ཡོད་ཚད་རྩིས་རྩིས་ཀྱི་མིག ང་ཚོའི་འབྲས་བུ ང་ཚོས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་མ་འོངས'}
{'en': 'Neural-Driven Search-Based Paraphrase Generation', 'pt': 'Geração de paráfrase baseada em pesquisa orientada por neurônios', 'es': 'Generación de paráfrasis basada en búsquedas impulsadas por neuronas', 'ar': 'جيل إعادة الصياغة المستند إلى البحث العصبي', 'fr': 'Génération de paraphrase basée sur la recherche basée sur les neurones', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका-चालित खोज-आधारित व्याख्या पीढ़ी', 'ja': 'ニューラルドリブン検索ベースのパラフレーズ生成', 'zh': '基于搜索之神经驱释义成', 'ru': 'Генерация парафраз на основе нейронного поиска', 'ga': 'Giniúint Athinsint Cuardaigh-Bhunaithe Neural-Tiomanta', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Neurális vezérelt keresési alapú parafráz generálás', 'el': 'Δημιουργία παραφράσεων με βάση την νευρική αναζήτηση', 'it': 'Generazione di parafrasi basata sulla ricerca neuronale', 'lt': 'Parafrazių generacija, pagrįsta paieška, pagrįsta neurologiniais veiksniais', 'mk': 'Генерација на парафрази базирани на пребарување на неврални директори', 'kk': 'Нейрондық драйвер іздеу негізінде парафра құрылуы', 'ms': 'Neural-Driven Search-Based Paraphrase Generation', 'ml': 'Neural-Driven Search-Based Paraphrase Generation', 'mt': 'Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Parafrażijiet Ibbażati fuq it-Tfittxija Ibbażata fuq Newrali', 'mn': 'Драйв-Драйв хайлтын үндсэн парафрейз үүсгэл', 'no': 'Generering av parametrar basert på søkjemodus', 'pl': 'Generowanie parafraz opartych na wyszukiwaniu neuronalnym', 'ro': 'Generare de parafrază bazată pe căutare neuronală', 'sr': 'Generacija parafraze na osnovu pretraživanja na neurovozu', 'so': 'Generation of Paraphrase-based search-engine', 'si': 'න්\u200dයූරාල- ඩ්\u200dරායිවින් සොයාගැනීම- ආධාරිත ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නිර්මාණය', 'sv': 'Neuraldriven sökbaserad parafrasgenerering', 'ur': 'Neural-Driven Search-Based Paraphrase Generation', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Neural-Driven Search-Based Paraphrase Generation', 'vi': 'Tự động tìm kiếm', 'nl': 'Neural-gedreven zoekgebaseerde parafrase generatie', 'da': 'Neuraldrevet søgebaseret parafrasegenerering', 'bg': 'Генериране на парафрази, базирано на нервно търсене', 'hr': 'Generacija parafraze na osnovu pretraživanja neurovozača', 'de': 'Neuronale suchbasierte Paraphrasenerzeugung', 'id': 'Generasi Parafrasa Berdasarkan Pencarian Drive-Neural', 'fa': 'تولید پارافریز بر اساس جستجو\u200cهای عصبی', 'tr': 'Näyral sürüjilik Arama tabanly Parafraz Bejer', 'sw': 'Kizalisho cha Paraphrase kinachotokana na utafutaji wa kisasa', 'af': 'Name', 'ko': '신경 구동 검색에 기초한 해석 생성', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i parafrazave të bazuara në kërkim të motorit nervor', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'የኩነቶች መረጃ', 'az': 'N칬ral-S칲r칲c칲 Arama 칖st칲nd톛ki Parafraz M톛xluqat캼', 'cs': 'Generování parafráz založených na neuronálním vyhledávání', 'bn': 'নিউরেল- ড্রাইভেন অনুসন্ধান- ভিত্তিক প্যারাফ্রাজের প্রজন্ম', 'ca': 'Generació de parafrases basades en la recerca', 'bs': 'Generacija parafraze na osnovu pretraživanja neurovozača', 'fi': 'Neurolähtöinen hakupohjainen parafraasien luominen', 'et': 'Neuraalse otsingupõhise parafraasi genereerimine', 'he': 'מיוצר פראפרזיה מבוססת חיפוש על מנוע עצבי', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje parafraznih fraz, ki temelji na živčnem iskanju', 'bo': 'སྒུལ་ཆས་འདྲ་བ་དང་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་འཚོལ་བཤེར་བྱེད་པའི་སྒྲ་ཚིགས་གསར་བཟོ', 'jv': 'Search'}
{'en': 'We study a search-based paraphrase generation scheme where candidate paraphrases are generated by iterated transformations from the original sentence and evaluated in terms of syntax quality, semantic distance, and lexical distance. The semantic distance is derived from BERT, and the lexical quality is based on GPT2 perplexity. To solve this multi-objective search problem, we propose two algorithms : Monte-Carlo Tree Search For Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) and Pareto Tree Search (PTS). We provide an extensive set of experiments on 5 datasets with a rigorous reproduction and validation for several state-of-the-art paraphrase generation algorithms. These experiments show that, although being non explicitly supervised, our algorithms perform well against these baselines.', 'ar': 'ندرس مخطط إنشاء إعادة الصياغة القائم على البحث حيث يتم إنشاء إعادة صياغة المرشح من خلال التحويلات المتكررة من الجملة الأصلية وتقييمها من حيث جودة بناء الجملة والمسافة الدلالية والمسافة المعجمية. المسافة الدلالية مشتقة من BERT ، وتستند الجودة المعجمية إلى تعقيد GPT2. لحل مشكلة البحث متعدد الأهداف ، نقترح خوارزميتين: Monte-Carlo Tree Search لإنشاء إعادة صياغة (MCPG) و Pareto Tree Search (PTS). نحن نقدم مجموعة واسعة من التجارب على 5 مجموعات بيانات مع إعادة إنتاج صارمة والتحقق من صحة العديد من خوارزميات إعادة الصياغة الحديثة. تظهر هذه التجارب أنه على الرغم من كونها غير خاضعة للإشراف الصريح ، إلا أن خوارزمياتنا تعمل بشكل جيد مقابل خطوط الأساس هذه.', 'es': 'Estudiamos un esquema de generación de paráfrasis basado en búsquedas en el que las paráfrasis candidatas se generan mediante transformaciones iteradas de la oración original y se evalúan en términos de calidad sintáctica, distancia semántica y distancia léxica. La distancia semántica se deriva del BERT y la calidad léxica se basa en la perplejidad de GPT2. Para resolver este problema de búsqueda multiobjetivo, proponemos dos algoritmos: Monte-Carlo Tree Search For Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) y Pareto Tree Search (PTS). Ofrecemos un amplio conjunto de experimentos en 5 conjuntos de datos con una reproducción y validación rigurosas para varios algoritmos de generación de paráfrasis de última generación. Estos experimentos muestran que, aunque no están supervisados explícitamente, nuestros algoritmos funcionan bien en comparación con estas líneas de base.', 'fr': "Nous étudions un système de génération de paraphrase basé sur la recherche dans lequel des paraphrases candidates sont générées par des transformations itérées à partir de la phrase originale et évaluées en termes de qualité syntaxique, de distance sémantique et de distance lexicale. La distance sémantique est dérivée du BERT, et la qualité lexicale est basée sur la perplexité GPT2. Pour résoudre ce problème de recherche multi-objectifs, nous proposons deux algorithmes\xa0: Monte-Carlo Tree Search For Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) et Pareto Tree Search (PTS). Nous proposons un vaste ensemble d'expériences sur 5 ensembles de données avec une reproduction et une validation rigoureuses pour plusieurs algorithmes de génération de paraphrase de pointe. Ces expériences montrent que, bien qu'ils ne soient pas supervisés explicitement, nos algorithmes fonctionnent bien par rapport à ces niveaux de référence.", 'pt': 'Estudamos um esquema de geração de paráfrase baseado em busca onde paráfrases candidatas são geradas por transformações iteradas da sentença original e avaliadas em termos de qualidade de sintaxe, distância semântica e distância lexical. A distância semântica é derivada do BERT e a qualidade lexical é baseada na perplexidade do GPT2. Para resolver este problema de busca multiobjetivo, propomos dois algoritmos: Monte-Carlo Tree Search For Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) e Pareto Tree Search (PTS). Fornecemos um extenso conjunto de experimentos em 5 conjuntos de dados com uma reprodução e validação rigorosas para vários algoritmos de geração de paráfrases de última geração. Esses experimentos mostram que, embora não sejam supervisionados explicitamente, nossos algoritmos funcionam bem em relação a essas linhas de base.', 'zh': '余考其释义生方案,其候选释义从原始句迭代转换生成,并随语法质量,语义去词汇相去评估。 语义去自BERT,词法质困于GPT2。 蒙特卡洛树搜索释义生成(MCPG)、帕累托树搜(PTS)。 5数集上广实验,先进释义算法。 此实验虽无显式监,吾算法在此基线下。', 'hi': 'हम एक खोज-आधारित व्याख्या पीढ़ी योजना का अध्ययन करते हैं जहां उम्मीदवार के अनुवाद मूल वाक्य से पुनरावृत्त रूपांतरणों द्वारा उत्पन्न होते हैं और वाक्यविन्यास गुणवत्ता, शब्दार्थ दूरी और लेक्सिकल दूरी के संदर्भ में मूल्यांकन किए जाते हैं। शब्दार्थ दूरी BERT से व्युत्पन्न है, और लेक्सिकल गुणवत्ता GPT2 उलझन पर आधारित है। इस बहु-उद्देश्य खोज समस्या को हल करने के लिए, हम दो एल्गोरिदम का प्रस्ताव करते हैं: मोंटे-कार्लो ट्री खोज के लिए पैराफ्रेज़ जनरेशन (MCPG) और परेटो ट्री खोज (PTS)। हम कई अत्याधुनिक पैराफ्रेज़ पीढ़ी एल्गोरिदम के लिए एक कठोर प्रजनन और सत्यापन के साथ 5 डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों का एक व्यापक सेट प्रदान करते हैं। इन प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि, हालांकि गैर-स्पष्ट रूप से पर्यवेक्षित होने के बावजूद, हमारे एल्गोरिदम इन बेसलाइन के खिलाफ अच्छा प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'ja': '私たちは、検索ベースのパラフレーズ生成スキームを研究しています。このスキームでは、元の文からの反復変換によって候補パラフレーズが生成され、構文の質、意味距離、および語彙距離の観点から評価されます。セマンティック距離はBERTから導出され、語彙品質はGPT 2の混乱に基づいています。この多目的検索問題を解決するために、モンテカルロツリー検索パラフレーズ生成（ MCPG ）とパレートツリー検索（ PTS ）の2つのアルゴリズムを提案します。私たちは、いくつかの最先端のパラフレーズ生成アルゴリズムの厳密な再現と検証を備えた5つのデータセットに関する広範な実験セットを提供します。これらの実験は、明示的に監視されていないが、当社のアルゴリズムがこれらのベースラインに対して良好に機能することを示している。', 'ru': 'Мы изучаем схему генерации парафраз на основе поиска, где кандидатные парафразы генерируются итерационными преобразованиями из исходного предложения и оцениваются с точки зрения качества синтаксиса, семантического расстояния и лексического расстояния. Семантическое расстояние выводится из BERT, а лексическое качество основано на недоумении GPT2. Для решения этой многоцелевой задачи поиска мы предлагаем два алгоритма: Monte-Carlo Tree Search For Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) и Pareto Tree Search (PTS). Мы предоставляем обширный набор экспериментов на 5 наборах данных с точным воспроизведением и валидацией для нескольких современных алгоритмов генерации парафраз. Эти эксперименты показывают, что, хотя наши алгоритмы явно не контролируются, они хорошо справляются с этими базовыми линиями.', 'ga': 'Déanaimid staidéar ar scéim giniúna athinsinte cuardaigh-bhunaithe ina ngintear athróga iarrthóra trí chlaochluithe atriallta ón abairt bhunaidh agus ina ndéantar meastóireacht orthu i dtéarmaí cáilíochta comhréire, fad shéimeantach, agus fad foclóireachta. Díorthaítear an fad shéimeantach ó BERT, agus tá an caighdeán foclóireachta bunaithe ar shárphléacsacht GPT2. Chun an fhadhb cuardaigh ilchuspóireach seo a réiteach, molaimid dhá algartam: Monte-Carlo Tree Search For Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) agus Pareto Tree Search (PTS). Cuirimid sraith fhairsing turgnamh ar 5 thacar sonraí ar fáil le atáirgeadh agus bailíochtú dian le haghaidh roinnt algartam giniúna parafrása den scoth. Léiríonn na turgnaimh seo, cé nach bhfuil siad faoi mhaoirseacht shainráite, go n-éiríonn go maith lenár n-halgartaim i gcoinne na mbunlínte seo.', 'hu': 'Egy keresési alapú parafráz generációs sémát tanulmányozunk, ahol a jelölt parafrázisok az eredeti mondatból származó iterált transzformációk által generálódnak és értékelik a szintaxisminőség, a szemantikai távolság és a lexikai távolság szempontjából. A szemantikai távolság a BERT-ből származik, a lexikai minőség pedig GPT2 zavarosságon alapul. A többcélú keresési probléma megoldásához két algoritmust javasolunk: Monte-Carlo Tree Search for Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) és Pareto Tree Search (PTS). Széles körű kísérletkészletet kínálunk 5 adatkészleten, szigorú reprodukcióval és validálással számos korszerű parafráz generáló algoritmushoz. Ezek a kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy bár nem kifejezetten felügyelnek, algoritmusaink jól teljesítenek ezekkel az alapvonalakkal szemben.', 'el': 'Μελετάμε ένα σχέδιο δημιουργίας παραφράσεων βασισμένο στην αναζήτηση όπου οι υποψήφιες παραφράσεις δημιουργούνται από επαναλαμβανόμενες μετασχηματίσεις από την αρχική πρόταση και αξιολογούνται ως προς την ποιότητα σύνταξης, τη σημασιολογική απόσταση και τη λεξική απόσταση. Η σημασιολογική απόσταση προέρχεται από το BERT, και η λεξική ποιότητα βασίζεται στην σύγχυση GPT2. Για την επίλυση αυτού του προβλήματος αναζήτησης πολλαπλών στόχων, προτείνουμε δύο αλγόριθμους: αναζήτηση δέντρου Μόντε Κάρλο για δημιουργία παραφράσεων (και αναζήτηση δέντρου Pareto (PTS). Παρέχουμε ένα εκτεταμένο σύνολο πειραμάτων σε πέντε σύνολα δεδομένων με αυστηρή αναπαραγωγή και επικύρωση για διάφορους υπερσύγχρονους αλγόριθμους παραγωγής παραφράσεων. Αυτά τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι, αν και δεν εποπτεύονται ρητά, οι αλγόριθμοι μας αποδίδουν καλά σε αυτές τις γραμμές βάσης.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ძებნა პარაფრაზეზების შექმნა სქემის შესწავლოთ, სადაც კანდიდენტის პარაფრაზეზები იქნება განახლებული ტრანფერაციების გამოყენებით, რომელიც იქნება სინტაქსის კალექტის, სიმენტი სიმენტიკური განტოლება BERT-ის განტოლება და ლექსიკალური კალექტია GPT2-ის პროპლექტის დაბაზია. ამ მრავალექტური ძიება პრობლემების გადაწყვეტისთვის, ჩვენ ორი ალგორიტემის მიზეზება: Monte- Carlo Tree Search for Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) და Pareto Tree Search (PTS). ჩვენ 5 მონაცემების განსაზღვრება და გადაწყვეტილების განსაზღვრებით ექსპერიმენტების უფრო დიდი სექსპერიმენტები დავწყებთ, რამდენიმე მონაცემების პარაფრეზის განვითა ეს ექსპერიმენტები აჩვენებენ, რომ, თუმცა არ განსხვავებულად დანარჩენა, ჩვენი ალგორიტები ძალიან გავაკეთებენ ამ ბაზის ხაზზე.', 'it': "Studiamo uno schema di generazione di parafrasi basato sulla ricerca in cui le parafrasi candidate sono generate da trasformazioni iterate dalla frase originale e valutate in termini di qualità sintattica, distanza semantica e distanza lessicale. La distanza semantica è derivata da BERT, e la qualità lessicale è basata sulla perplessità GPT2. Per risolvere questo problema di ricerca multi-obiettivo, proponiamo due algoritmi: Monte-Carlo Tree Search For Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) e Pareto Tree Search (PTS). Forniamo un ampio set di esperimenti su 5 set di dati con una rigorosa riproduzione e convalida per diversi algoritmi di generazione di parafrasi all'avanguardia. Questi esperimenti dimostrano che, pur non essendo esplicitamente supervisionati, i nostri algoritmi funzionano bene rispetto a queste linee di base.", 'kk': 'Біз іздеу негіздеген парафразды құру сұлбасын зерттеп, кандидатты парафразтарды бастапқы сөзден қайталанатын түрлендіру сұлбасынан жасап, синтаксис сапаты, semantic қашықтығы мен лексикалық қашықтығы қа Semantic distance is derived from BERT, and the lexical quality is based on GPT2 perplexity. Бұл көп мақсатты іздеу мәселесін шешу үшін екі алгоритм: Monte- Carlo Tree Search Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) және Pareto Tree Search (PTS) дегенді таңдаймыз. Біз 5 деректер қорларындағы кеңейтілген тәжірибелерді бірнеше парафраз жасау алгоритмдер үшін қатты репродукциялау және тексеру арқылы көптеген тәжірибелерді келтіреміз. Бұл тәжірибелер дұрыс бақыламағанда, алгоритмдеріміз осы негізгі жолдарға қарсы жақсы жұмыс істейді.', 'ml': 'ഒരു തെരച്ചില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഒരു പദ്ധതിയുടെ പദ്ധതിയാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത്. പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിയായ വാക്കില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d സൃ ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള സെമാന്റിക് ദൂരം ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയില്\u200d നിന്നും നിര്\u200dത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d ഗി ഇതിന്റെ അധികമായ തെരച്ചില്\u200d പരിഹരിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ടു ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു: മോണ്ട്-കാര്\u200dളോ വൃക്ഷത്തിന്റെ തിരച്ചില്\u200d  നമ്മള്\u200d 5 ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d ഒരു വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നു. ഒരു കഠിനമായ പ്രവർത്തിപ്പിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. കുറച്ച് സ്ഥാ ഈ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു, പ്രത്യക്ഷമായി നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാതിരിക്കുമ്പോഴും, നമ്മുടെ ആല്\u200d', 'mt': 'Aħna nistudjaw skema ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ parafrażijiet ibbażata fuq it-tiftix fejn parafrażijiet kandidati jiġu ġġenerati minn trasformazzjonijiet iterati mis-sentenza oriġinali u evalwati f’termini ta’ kwalità tas-sintaks, distanza semantika, u distanza lexika. Id-distanza semantika hija derivata minn BERT, u l-kwalità lexika hija bbażata fuq perplessità GPT2. Biex issolvi din il-problema ta’ tiftix multioġġettiv, nipproponu żewġ algoritmi: it-tiftix fis-siġar ta’ Monte-Carlo għal ġenerazzjoni ta’ parafrażi (MCPG) u t-tiftix fis-siġar ta’ Pareto (PTS). Aħna nipprovdu sett estensiv ta’ esperimenti fuq ħames settijiet ta’ dejta b’riproduzzjoni u validazzjoni rigorużi għal diversi algoritmi ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ parafrażi l-aktar avvanzati. Dawn l-esperimenti juru li, għalkemm mhumiex issorveljati b’mod espliċitu, l-algoritmi tagħna jwettqu tajjeb kontra dawn il-linji bażi.', 'mn': 'Бид хайлтын үндсэн парафрейз бүтээлийн схемийг судалж байлаа. Харин одоогийн парафрейз нь эхний өгүүлбэрээс дахин өөрчлөлтийг гаргаж, синтаксик чанар, semantic зай, лексикийн зай гэх мэт үнэлэх болно. Земантик зай нь BERT-ээс гарч ирсэн ба лексикийн чанар GPT2-ын төвөгтэй байдал дээр суурилсан. Энэ олон зорилготой хайлтын асуудлыг шийдэхийн тулд бид хоёр алгоритм: Монте-Карло мод хайх парафразын төлөөлөл (MCPG) болон Pareto Tree Search (PTS) гэсэн санал өгдөг. Бид 5 өгөгдлийн сан дээр маш олон туршилтуудыг олон төрлийн урлагийн парафрейз үеийн алгоритмын төлөө хүчтэй үржүүлэх болон шалгалтыг өгдөг. Эдгээр туршилтууд тодорхой харагдахгүй ч, бидний алгоритм эдгээр суурь шулуунуудын эсрэг сайн ажилладаг.', 'no': 'Vi studerer eit søkebasert parafraseslag der kandidatparafrasar blir generert av gjentaande transformasjonar frå den opprinnelige setninga og evaluerte under syntakskvaliteten, semantisk avstanden og leksisk avstanden. Semantisk avstanden er avhengig frå BERT, og leksisk kvalitet er basert på GPT2-kompleksitet. For å løse denne fleire målsøkeproblemet, fører vi to algoritme: Monte- Carlo Tree Search for Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) og Pareto TreeSearch (PTS). Vi gjev eit utvida sett eksperimenter på 5 datasett med ein sterk reproduksjon og validering for fleire algoritmer for å generera parafrasen i kunsttilstanden. Desse eksperimentene viser at, selv om det ikkje er eksplisert oversikt, våre algoritme utfører godt mot desse grunnlinjene.', 'mk': 'Студираме шема на генерација на парафрази базирана на пребарување каде кандидатските парафрази се генерирани со итерирани трансформации од оригиналната реченица и оценети во поглед на квалитетот на синтаксијата, семантичната дистанца и лексичната дистанца. Семантичката оддалеченост се изведува од BERT, а лексичкиот квалитет се базира на GPT2 заглавеност. За да го решиме овој мултиобјективен пребарувачки проблем, предложуваме два алгоритми: пребарување на дрво Монте-Карло за генерација на парафрази (MCPG) и пребарување на дрво Парето (PTS). Ние обезбедуваме експерименти на 5 податоци со строго репродукција и валидација за неколку најсовремени алгоритми за генерација на парафрази. Овие експерименти покажуваат дека иако не се експлицитно надгледувани, нашите алгоритми успеваат добро против овие основни линии.', 'lt': 'We study a search-based paraphrase generation scheme where candidate paraphrases are generated by iterated transformations from the original sentence and evaluated in terms of syntax quality, semantic distance, and lexical distance.  Semantinis atstumas gaunamas iš BERT, o leksinė kokybė grindžiama GPT2 perpleksija. To solve this multi-objective search problem, we propose two algorithms: Monte-Carlo Tree Search For Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) and Pareto Tree Search (PTS).  Pateikiame platų eksperimentų rinkinį su 5 duomenų rinkiniais su griežta reprodukcija ir patvirtinimu keliems naujausiems parafrazių generavimo algoritmams. Šie eksperimentai rodo, kad nors ir nėra aiškiai prižiūrimi, mūsų algoritmai gerai veikia prieš šias bazines linijas.', 'ms': 'Kami mempelajari skema generasi parafrasa berdasarkan gelintar dimana parafrasa calon dijana oleh transformasi berulang dari kalimat asal dan diteliti dalam terma kualiti sintaks, jarak semantik, dan jarak leksikal. Jarak semantik ditambah dari BERT, dan kualiti leksikal berdasarkan kekeliruan GPT2. To solve this multi-objective search problem, we propose two algorithms: Monte-Carlo Tree Search For Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) and Pareto Tree Search (PTS).  Kami menyediakan set ekstensif eksperimen pada 5 set data dengan reproduksi dan pengesahihan yang ketat untuk beberapa algoritma generasi parafrasa state-of-the-art. Eksperimen ini menunjukkan bahawa walaupun tidak secara eksplicit mengawasi, algoritma kita berjaya dengan baik melawan garis dasar ini.', 'pl': 'Badamy schemat generowania parafraz oparty na wyszukiwaniu, w którym parafrazy kandydatów są generowane przez iterowane transformacje z oryginalnego zdania i oceniane pod kątem jakości składni, odległości semantycznej i dystansu leksykalnego. Odległość semantyczna pochodzi z BERT, a jakość leksykaliczna opiera się na niejasności GPT2. Aby rozwiązać ten wielobiektywny problem wyszukiwania, proponujemy dwa algorytmy: Monte-Carlo Tree Search For Parafrase Generation (MCPG) i Pareto Tree Search (PTS). Zapewniamy obszerny zestaw eksperymentów na pięciu zbiorach danych z rygorystyczną reprodukcją i walidacją dla kilku najnowocześniejszych algorytmów generowania parafraz. Eksperymenty te pokazują, że choć nie są wyraźnie nadzorowane, nasze algorytmy działają dobrze w stosunku do tych linii bazowych.', 'ro': 'Studiem o schemă de generare a parafrazelor bazată pe căutare în care parafrazele candidate sunt generate de transformări iterate din propoziția originală și evaluate în termeni de calitate sintaxă, distanță semantică și distanță lexicală. Distanța semantică este derivată din BERT, iar calitatea lexicală se bazează pe perplexitatea GPT2. Pentru a rezolva această problemă de căutare multiobiectivă, propunem doi algoritmi: Monte-Carlo Tree Search For Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) și Pareto Tree Search (PTS). Oferim un set extins de experimente pe 5 seturi de date cu o reproducere riguroasă și validare pentru mai mulți algoritmi de generare a parafrazelor de ultimă generare. Aceste experimente arată că, deși nu sunt supravegheați explicit, algoritmii noștri performează bine în raport cu aceste linii de referință.', 'sr': 'Proučavamo šemu generacije parafraze na temelju pretraživanja gdje su kandidatske parafraze generirane ponovnim transformacijama iz originalne rečenice i procjenjivane u smislu kvalitete sintaksa, semantičke udaljenosti i leksičke udaljenosti. Semantička udaljenost je iz BERT-a, a leksička kvaliteta je zasnovana na GPT2 kompleksnosti. Da bi riješili ovaj multiobjektivni problem pretraživanja, predlažemo dva algoritma: Monte-Carlo Tree Search for Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) i Pareto Tree Search (PTS). Mi pružamo širok niz eksperimenata na 5 dataseta sa rigorom reprodukcijom i validacijom za nekoliko algoritma generacije parafraze stanja umjetnosti. Ovi eksperimenti pokazuju da, iako nisu eksperimentalno nadzirani, naši algoritmi dobro izvode protiv ove osnovne linije.', 'si': 'අපි පරීක්ෂණය අධාරිත ප්\u200dරකාශ පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණයක් පරීක්ෂණයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, මුලින් වාක්ෂාව, සෙමැන්ටික් දුරය, ලෙක්සි සෙමැන්ටික් දුර BERT වලින් පිළිගන්නවා, ඒ වගේම ලෙක්සිකාලික කුළුවත් GPT2 විශේෂතාවට අධාරිත වෙනවා. මේ ගොඩක් අභ්\u200dයාජික පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසඳන්න, අපි ඇල්ගෝරිතම් දෙකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා: මොන්ට්- කාර්ලෝ ට්\u200dරි සොයාගන්න පැ අපි දත්ත සෙට් 5 ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙන්නේ නැති ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ විශේෂ සම්බන්ධයක් සඳහා විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස මේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ ඒ වගේම, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නොපරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙනවා නමුත්, අපේ ඇල්ගෝරිතම් මේ මූල', 'so': 'Waxaan baranaynaa qorshaha muuqashada afka raadinta oo lagu qoray, halkaas oo ay ku soo bandhigaan baaritaanka lagu beddelo hadalka asalka ah, waxaana lagu qiimeynayaa tusaale ahaan suurtagalka kaalmada, fogta semantika iyo fogka leksiga. Meelaha semantika waxaa laga soo jeedaa BERT, qiimaha leksikalna waxay ku saleysan tahay GPT2 muran. Si aan u xallino dhibaatadan raadinta oo badan, waxaan soo jeedaynaa laba algorithm: Monte-Carlo Tree Search for Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) iyo Search for Tree Pareto (PTS). Waxaannu fidinnaa imtixaamo badan oo ku qoran 5-databases, waxaana ku sameynaynaa soo saaridda si adag ah oo loo xaqiijiyo qoraal-xaalad-ka-farshaxanka. Imtixaankan waxay muuqataa in kastoo aan si cad loo ilaalinayn, algoreemadayaga ayaa si wanaagsan looga jeedaa saldhigyadan.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு தேடல் அடிப்படையிலான சொற்றொடர் உருவாக்கும் திட்டத்தை படிக்கிறோம் அதில் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட வாக்கியத்திலிருந்து மாற்றங்கள் உருவாக்கப் The semantic distance is from BERT, and the lexical quality is based on GPT2 perplexity. இந்த பல பொருள் தேடுதல் பிரச்சனையை தீர்வு செய்வதற்கு, நாம் இரண்டு பிரிவுகளை தேர்வு செய்கிறோம்: மாண்ட்- கார்லோ மரத்தை தேடுதல் பாராடோ மரத்த 5 தரவுத்தளத்தில் நாம் ஒரு விரிவான சோதனைகளை வழங்குகிறோம். இது கடுமையான முதலீடு மற்றும் சரிபார்த்தல் மற்றும் செல்லுபடியாகும் பல ந இந்த சோதனைகள், வெளிப்படையாக பார்க்கப்படாமல் இருந்தாலும், எங்கள் ஆல்gorithms இந்த அடிப்படை', 'sv': 'Vi studerar ett sökbaserat parafrasgenereringsschema där kandidatparafraser genereras av itererade transformationer från den ursprungliga meningen och utvärderas i termer av syntaxkvalitet, semantiskt avstånd och lexikalt avstånd. Det semantiska avståndet härrör från BERT, och den lexikala kvaliteten baseras på GPT2 perplexitet. För att lösa detta flerobjektiva sökproblem föreslår vi två algoritmer: Monte-Carlo Tree Search For Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) och Pareto Tree Search (PTS). Vi tillhandahåller en omfattande uppsättning experiment på 5 dataset med rigorös reproduktion och validering för flera state-of-the-art parafrasgenereringsalgoritmer. Dessa experiment visar att våra algoritmer, även om de inte är uttryckligen övervakade, presterar bra mot dessa baslinjer.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک تلاش کی بنیاد پارافریز پیدائش کی تصویر پڑھتے ہیں جہاں کاندینٹ پارافریز اصلی جماعت سے دوبارہ تغییرات کے ذریعہ پیدا کئے جاتے ہیں اور سینٹکس کیفیت، سیمنٹی فاصلہ اور لکسیکل فاصلہ کے ذریعہ مطابق ار سیمنٹی فاصلہ BERT سے پھیری جاتی ہے، اور لکسیکل کیفیت GPT2 پرپرلکسٹی پر بنیاد ہے. ہم دو الگوریتم پیشنهاد کریں گے: مونٹ-کارلو ٹی سیچ پارافریز پیدا کرنا (MCPG) اور پاریٹو ٹی سیچ (PTS) کے لئے۔ ہم پانچ ڈاٹ سٹ پر ایک بڑی آزمائش مجموعہ دیتے ہیں کہ بہت سی موقعیت پارافریزہ نسل الگوریٹم کے لئے بہت سخت بازگشت اور validation کے ساتھ۔ یہ آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ اگرچہ صریح طور پر نظر نہیں آتے، ہمارے الگوریتم ان بنیاس لینوں کے خلاف بہت اچھے کام کرتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Biz qidirish asosiy paraphrasning yaratish qolipini o'rganamiz, bu holatda, kandida paraphraslarning asl so'zlaridan o'zgarishlar yaratiladi va sinkas sifatida, semantik masofa va leksikal masofadaga qiymatdik. Semantik uzunligi BERT dan olingan va leksikal сифат GPT2 murakkablariga asosida. Bu ko'plab obʼektlarni qidirish muammosini topish uchun biz ikkita algoritni talab qilamiz: Monte-Carlo Tree Search for Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) va Pareto Tree qidirish (PTS). Biz 5 maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi katta tajribalarni taʼminlovchi va bir necha holatdagi shaxsiy paraphrasing taʼminotlari algoritlariga haqiqiqiylik qilamiz. Bu jarayonlarni ko'rsatadigan ko'rsatish mumkin, agar tashkilotlarni tashqi ko'rinishimiz mumkin, bizning algoritlarimiz bu asboblar bilan yaxshi bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi nghiên cứu một kế hoạch phân tích tâm lý tìm kiếm nơi các diễn văn học được tạo ra bởi các phiên bản lặp lại từ câu nguyên bản gốc và đánh giá theo chất lượng cú pháp, độ dài ngữ văn và độ dài từ. Khoảng cách đơn giản bắt nguồn từ hỗn hợp BERT, và chất độc học dựa trên tính phức tạp của GP2. Để giải quyết vấn đề tìm kiếm đa mục tiêu này, chúng tôi đề nghị hai thuật toán: Monte Carlo Tree Search for Paracụm từ Gen (MCPG) và Pareto Tree Search (PTS). Chúng tôi cung cấp một loạt thí nghiệm rộng rãi trên 5 nhà dữ liệu với một thuật toán nghiên cứu khắt khe và xác thực cho nhiều thuật toán nghệ thuật. Những thí nghiệm này cho thấy, mặc dù không được giám sát trực tiếp, thuật toán của chúng tôi có hiệu quả đối với những đường cơ bản.', 'da': 'Vi studerer et søgebaseret parafrasegenereringsskema, hvor kandidatparafraser genereres af itererede transformationer fra den oprindelige sætning og evalueres med hensyn til syntakskvalitet, semantisk afstand og leksikalsk afstand. Den semantiske afstand er afledt af BERT, og den leksikalske kvalitet er baseret på GPT2 forvirring. For at løse dette multi-objektive søgeproblem, foreslår vi to algoritmer: Monte-Carlo Tree Search For Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) og Pareto Tree Search (PTS). Vi leverer et omfattende sæt af eksperimenter på 5 datasæt med en streng reproduktion og validering af flere state-of-the-art parafrase generation algoritmer. Disse eksperimenter viser, at selvom vores algoritmer ikke udtrykkeligt overvåges, fungerer vores algoritmer godt i forhold til disse basislinjer.', 'bg': 'Изследваме базирана на търсене схема за генериране на парафрази, при която кандидатите парафрази се генерират чрез итерационни трансформации от първоначалното изречение и се оценяват по отношение на качеството на синтаксиса, семантичното разстояние и лексикалното разстояние. Сентичното разстояние се извлича от BERT, а лексикалното качество се основава на GPT2 perplexity. За решаване на този многообективен проблем с търсенето предлагаме два алгоритма: Монте Карло Дърво Търсене за генериране на парафрази (MCPG) и Парето Дърво Търсене (PTS). Ние предлагаме обширен набор от експерименти върху 5 набора от данни с строго възпроизвеждане и валидиране на няколко най-съвременни алгоритми за генериране на парафрази. Тези експерименти показват, че въпреки че не са изрично контролирани, нашите алгоритми работят добре срещу тези базови линии.', 'nl': 'We bestuderen een zoekgebaseerd parafrasegeneratieschema waarbij kandidaatparafrases worden gegenereerd door iteratieve transformaties van de oorspronkelijke zin en geëvalueerd in termen van syntaxiskwaliteit, semantische afstand en lexicale afstand. De semantische afstand is afgeleid van BERT, en de lexicale kwaliteit is gebaseerd op GPT2 verwarring. Om dit multi-objectieve zoekprobleem op te lossen, stellen we twee algoritmes voor: Monte-Carlo Tree Search For Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) en Pareto Tree Search (PTS). We bieden een uitgebreide reeks experimenten op vijf datasets met een rigoureuze reproductie en validatie voor verschillende state-of-the-art parafrase generatie algoritmen. Deze experimenten tonen aan dat, hoewel niet expliciet gecontroleerd, onze algoritmes goed presteren tegen deze baselines.', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen ein suchbasiertes Paraphrasengenerationsschema, bei dem Kandidatenpaphrasen durch iterierte Transformationen aus dem Originalsatz generiert und in Bezug auf Syntaxqualität, semantische Distanz und lexikalische Distanz bewertet werden. Der semantische Abstand wird von BERT abgeleitet, und die lexikalische Qualität basiert auf GPT2 Verwirrung. Um dieses multiobjektive Suchproblem zu lösen, schlagen wir zwei Algorithmen vor: Monte-Carlo Tree Search For Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) und Pareto Tree Search (PTS). Wir bieten eine umfangreiche Reihe von Experimenten an fünf Datensätzen mit einer rigorosen Reproduktion und Validierung für mehrere State-of-the-Art Paraphrasen-Generierungsalgorithmen. Diese Experimente zeigen, dass unsere Algorithmen, obwohl sie nicht explizit überwacht werden, gut gegen diese Baselines funktionieren.', 'id': 'Kami mempelajari skema generasi parafrasa berdasarkan pencarian dimana parafrasa kandidat dihasilkan oleh transformasi iterasi dari kalimat asli dan diteliti dalam terma kualitas sintaks, jarak semantis, dan jarak lexik. Jarak semantis berasal dari BERT, dan kualitas leksik berdasarkan perplexi GPT2. Untuk memecahkan masalah pencarian multi-objektif ini, kami mengusulkan dua algoritma: Monte-Carlo Tree Search For Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) dan Pareto Tree Search (PTS). Kami menyediakan set ekstensif eksperimen pada 5 set data dengan reproduksi dan validasi yang ketat untuk beberapa algoritma generasi parafrasa state-of-the-art. Eksperimen ini menunjukkan bahwa, meskipun tidak secara eksplisit diawasi, algoritma kita berhasil melawan garis dasar ini.', 'hr': 'Proučavamo sustav generacije parafraze na temelju pretraživanja gdje su kandidatske parafraze proizvedene ponovnim transformacijama iz originalne rečenice i procijenjene u smislu kvalitete sintaksa, semantičke udaljenosti i leksičke udaljenosti. Semantička udaljenost je iz BERT-a, a leksička kvaliteta je temeljena na GPT2 perpleksiji. Da bi riješili ovaj multiobjektivni problem pretraživanja, predlažemo dva algoritma: Monte-Carlo Tree Search for Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) i Pareto Tree Search (PTS). Mi pružamo širok skup eksperimenata na 5 podataka s rigorom reprodukcijom i validacijom za nekoliko algoritma generacije parafraze stanja umjetnosti. Ovi eksperimenti pokazuju da, iako nisu explicitno nadzirani, naši algoritmi dobro izvode protiv te osnovne linije.', 'ko': '우리는 검색을 바탕으로 하는 해석 생성 방안을 연구했는데 그 중에서 후보 해석은 원시 문장에 대한 교체 전환을 통해 생성되고 문법의 질, 의미 거리와 어휘 거리에 따라 평가된다.의미 거리는 BERT에서 유래하고 어휘의 질은 GPT2 곤혹도에서 유래한다.이 다목적 검색 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 해석으로 생성된 몬테카로 트리 검색(MCPG)과 파르토리코 트리 검색(PTS) 두 가지 알고리즘을 제시했다.우리는 5개 데이터 집합에서 대량의 실험을 실시했고 몇 가지 가장 선진적인 해석 생성 알고리즘을 엄격하게 복제하고 검증했다.이러한 실험은 비록 명확한 감독이 없지만 우리의 알고리즘이 이러한 기선 아래에서 양호하다는 것을 보여 준다.', 'fa': 'ما برنامه\u200cی نسخه\u200cهای پارافریز بر اساس جستجو را مطالعه می\u200cکنیم که پارافریز کاندیدا توسط تغییرات دوباره\u200cریخته شده از جمله اصلی تولید می\u200cشوند و به عنوان کیفیت سنتاکس، فاصله\u200cهای semantic و فاصله\u200cهای زبان ارزی فاصله semantic از BERT استفاده می\u200cشود و کیفیت زبان\u200cشناسی بر اساس گستردگی GPT2 بنیاد می\u200cگیرد. برای حل این مشکل جستجوی چندین هدف، دو الگوریتم پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم: جستجوی درخت مانت-کارلو برای تولید پارافراز (MCPG) و جستجوی درخت Pareto (PTS). ما یک مجموعه آزمایش بسیار گسترده در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای ۵ با یک تولید شدید و تصدیق برای چندین الگوریتم\u200cهای نسل پارافریزهای هنر را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. این آزمایشات نشان می دهند که، اگرچه به طور کامل تحت نظر نمی\u200cگیرند، الگوریتم\u200cهای ما در مقابل این خط\u200cهای زیرزمین خوب انجام می\u200cدهند.', 'sw': 'Tunafuatilia mpango wa kizazi kilichotengenezwa na mabadiliko yanayotengenezwa na sentensi ya awali na kutathmini kwa kiwango cha usawa wa kodi, umbali wa sekunde na umbali wa lexico. Mpaka wa sekondari umetokana na BERT, na kiwango cha lexico kinatokana na utata wa GPT2. Ili kutatua tatizo hili la kutafuta lengo nyingi, tunapendekeza vipengele viwili: Mti wa Monte-Carlo Search for Generation of Paraphrase (MCPG) na Search for Tree ya Pareto (PTS). Tunatoa majaribio mengi kwenye seti za takwimu mitano yenye uzalishaji na uhakikishaji wa vizazi vingi vya sanaa. These experiments show that, although being non explicitly supervised, our algorithms perform well against these baselines.', 'tr': "Arama tabanly bir parafraz döredişi taslamasyny öwrenip otyrdyk. Kandidatyň parafrazlerini öz başlangyç sözlerinden tekrar edip görkezilýän terjimeleri tarapyndan döredildi we sintaks kwaliteti, semantik aralygy we leksik aralygyna görä deňlenýäris Semantik aralygy BERT'den berilýär we leksiýaly kwalitet GPT2 mümkinçiligine daýanýar. Bu multi-objektif arama meseleni çözmek üçin iki algoritmi teklip ediyoruz: Monte-Carlo Tree Search for Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) we Pareto Tree Search (PTS). Biz 5 veri setlerde gaty bir deneyler taýýarlyk edip, bir näçe möhüm bolan parafraz döredilmesi üçin deňlenmek bilen üýtgedýäris Bu deneyler belli-da gözleýän däldigine garamazdan hem, algoritmalarymyz bu basehatlaryň garşynda gowy dowam edýär.", 'af': "Ons ondersoek 'n soektog-gebaseerde parafrase generasie skema waar kandidate parafrase genereer word deur iterateerde transformasies van die oorspronklike seting en evalueer in terms van sintaks kwaliteit, semantiese afstand en leksieafstand. Die semantiese afstand is van BERT afgelei, en die leksiese kwaliteit is gebaseer op GPT2 perpleksie. Om hierdie multiobjekte soektog probleem te los, voorstel ons twee algoritme: Monte- Carlo Boom Soektog vir Parafrase Generasie (MCPG) en Pareto Boom Soektog (PTS). Ons verskaf 'n uitbreidige stel eksperimente op 5 datastelle met 'n rige reproduksie en geldigheid vir verskeie staat-van-kuns parafrase generasie algoritme. Hierdie eksperimente wys dat, alhoewel ons nie uitgespreek is nie, ons algoritme goed teen hierdie basisline uitvoer.", 'am': 'የፊደል ግንኙነት የፊደል ግንኙነትን እናስተምራለን፡፡ የsemantic ርቀት BERT ነው፣ የሊክሲካዊውም ጥሩ GPT2 ውጤት በመሠረት ነው፡፡ ይህንን ብዙአዊ ምርጫዎች ለመፈጸም፣ ሁለትን አሌጎርት: ሞት-ካርሎ ዛፍ ለመፍረስ የፋራሲ ትውልድ (MCPG) እና የፓሮቲ ዛፍ ፈልግ (PTS) እና መፈለጊያውን እናስገልጻለን፡፡ በአምስት ዳታተሮች ላይ ብዙ ተፈተናዎችን እና ለብዙዎች የዓርት ትውልድ አሌጎሪትምን እናደርጋለን፡፡ እነዚህ ፈተናዎች ምንም እንኳ ግልፅ ያልተገለጹ ቢኾኑም እንግዲህ አሌጎራቶቻችን በዚህ መደገፊያ ላይ መልካም ይደረጋሉ፡፡', 'hy': "Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք փնտրման հիմնված պարաֆրեզների ստեղծման ծրագիր, որտեղ թեկնածու պարաֆրեզները ստեղծվում են սկզբնական նախադասությունից կրկնվող վերափոխություններով և գնահատվում են սինտաքսի որակի, սեմանտիկ հեռավորության և լեքսիկա Սեմանտիկ հեռավորությունը ստացվում է BER-ից, և լեքսիկական որակը հիմնված է GPT2 խառնաշփոթության վրա: Այս բազմաօբյեկտիվ որոնման խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք երկու ալգորիթմ' Մոնտե-Կարլոյի ծառի պարաֆրազիայի ստեղծման (MCPG) և Pareto ծառի պարաֆրազիայի (PՏS) որոնման համար: Մենք հինգ տվյալների համակարգերի վրա բազմազան փորձարկումներ ենք տրամադրում խիստ վերարտադրելով և հավասարեցնելով տարբեր ամենաբարձր պարաֆրեզի ստեղծման ալգորիթմներ: Այս փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ չնայած, որ մեր ալգորիթմները բացահայտորեն վերահսկված չեն, մեր ալգորիթմները լավ են աշխատում այս հիմնական գծերի դեմ:", 'az': 'Biz arama tabanlńĪ parafraz √ľr…ôkl…ôri taslańüńĪ √∂yr…ônirik. Kandidat parafrazl…ôrini orijinal c√ľml…ôd…ôn yenid…ôn d…ôyiŇüdirilmiŇü v…ô sintaks keyfiyy…ôti, semantik uzaqlarńĪ v…ô leksik uzaqlarńĪ il…ô deńüerlendirilmiŇü. Semantik uzaq BERT t…ôr…ôfind…ôn alńĪndńĪ v…ô leksik keyfiyy…ôti GPT2 m√ľxt…ôlif t…ôr…ôfind…ôn dayanńĪlńĪr. Bu √ßoxlu-objektif arama problemini √ß…ôkm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn, iki algoritmi t…ôklif edirik: Monte-Carlo ańüacńĪ Arama Parafraz M…ôxluqatńĪ (MCPG) v…ô Pareto AńüacńĪ Arama (PTS). Biz 5 veril…ôn qurńüuda b√∂y√ľk bir s√ľr…ô eksperimenti t…ômin edirik, bir √ßox m√∂hk…ôm reproducasyon v…ô t…ôsdiql…ônm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn bir √ßox sanat parafraz n…ôsili algoritmi. Bu t…ôcr√ľb…ôl…ôr…ô g√∂st…ôrir ki, a√ßńĪq-aydńĪn g√∂zl…ônm…ôy…ôn halda, algoritmalarńĪmńĪz bu s…ôhif…ôl…ôr…ô qarŇüńĪ yaxŇüńĪ iŇül…ôr edir.', 'sq': 'Ne studiojmë një skemë gjenerative parafraze bazuar në kërkim ku parafrazat kandidate gjenerohen nga transformimet e përsëritura nga fraza origjinale dhe vlerësohen në termat e cilësisë së sintaksit, distancës semantike dhe distancës lexike. Distanca semantike derivohet nga BERT, dhe cilësia lexike bazohet në perplexitetin GPT2. Për të zgjidhur këtë problem kërkimi shumëobjektiv, propozojmë dy algoritme: kërkim në pemë Monte-Carlo për gjenerimin e parafrazave (MCPG) dhe kërkim në pemë Pareto (PTS). Ne ofrojmë një sërë eksperimentesh të gjerë në 5 sëra të dhënash me një riprodhim rigoroz dhe validim për disa algoritme të gjenerimit të parafrazave më të moderne. Këto eksperimente tregojnë se megjithëse nuk janë mbikqyrur haptazi, algoritmet tona funksionojnë mirë kundër këtyre linjave bazë.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি অনুসন্ধানের ভিত্তিক প্যারাফ্রেস প্রজন্ম পরিকল্পনা গবেষণা করছি যেখানে প্রার্থীরা প্যারার্থীর প্যারাফেক্রেস তৈরি করেছে মূল বাক্য থেকে বিন সেমেন্টিক দূরত্ব বের্ট থেকে উৎপাদন করা হয়েছে এবং লেক্সিক্যাল মান জিপিটি২ পার্টিক্সিটির উপর ভিত্তিক। এই অনেক উদ্দেশ্য অনুসন্ধানের সমস্যা সমাধানের জন্য আমরা দুটি অ্যালগরিদম প্রস্তাব করি: মোন্ট কার্লো গাছের জন্য প্যারাফ্রাজ জ জেনারেশন (এমসিপিজি)  আমরা ৫টি ডাটাসেটে বিস্তারিত পরীক্ষা দিয়েছি যেখানে বেশ কয়েকটি রাষ্ট্র-শিল্প প্যারাফ্রেস প্রজন্ম অ্যালগরিদমের জন্য একটি কঠি এই পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে, যদিও স্পষ্ট পর্যবেক্ষণ না করা হচ্ছে, আমাদের অ্যালগরিদমগুলো এই বেসারেলাইনের বিরুদ্ধে', 'bs': 'Proučavamo šemu generacije parafraze na temelju pretraživanja gdje su kandidatske parafraze proizvedene ponovnim transformacijama iz originalne rečenice i procjene u smislu kvalitete sintaksa, semantičke udaljenosti i leksičke udaljenosti. Semantička udaljenost je iz BERT-a, a leksička kvaliteta je temeljena na GPT2 kompleksnosti. Da bi riješili ovaj multiobjektivni problem pretraživanja, predlažemo dva algoritma: Monte-Carlo Tree Search for Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) i Pareto Tree Search (PTS). Mi pružamo širok niz eksperimenata na 5 dataseta sa rigorom reprodukcijom i validacijom za nekoliko algoritma generacije parafraze stanja umjetnosti. Ovi eksperimenti pokazuju da, iako nisu eksplicitno nadzirani, naši algoritmi dobro izvode protiv ovih osnovnih linija.', 'ca': "Estudem un esquema de generació de parafrases basat en la recerca on les parafrases candidates es generen per transformacions iterats de la frase original i es valoren en termes de qualitat de sintaxi, distància semàntica i distància lexical. La distància semàntica està derivada de BERT, i la qualitat lèxica està basada en la perplexitat GPT2. Per resoldre aquest problema de cerca multiobjectiu, proposem dos algoritmes: Monte-Carlo Tree Search for Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) i Pareto Tree Search (PTS). Ens proporcionem un conjunt extens d'experiments en 5 conjunts de dades amb una rigorosa reproducció i validació per a diversos algoritmes de generació de parafrases més avançats. Aquests experiments mostren que, encara que no siguin supervisats explícitament, els nostres algoritmes actuen bé en contra d'aquestes línies de base.", 'cs': 'Studujeme vyhledávací schéma generování parafrází, kde jsou kandidátské parafráze generovány iterovanými transformacemi z původní věty a hodnoceny z hlediska kvality syntaxe, sémantické vzdálenosti a lexikální vzdálenosti. Sémantická vzdálenost je odvozena z BERT a lexikální kvalita je založena na zmatenosti GPT2. Pro vyřešení tohoto víceobjektivního vyhledávacího problému navrhujeme dva algoritmy: Monte-Carlo Tree Search For Parafráze Generation (MCPG) a Pareto Tree Search (PTS). Poskytujeme rozsáhlou sadu experimentů na pěti datových sadách s přísnou reprodukcí a validací pro několik nejmodernějších algoritmů generace parafráz. Tyto experimenty ukazují, že i když nejsou explicitně kontrolovány, naše algoritmy vůči těmto základním liniím fungují dobře.', 'et': 'Uurime otsingupõhist parafraaside genereerimise skeemi, kus kandidaadiparafraasid genereeritakse itereeritud transformatsioonidega algsest lausest ja hinnatakse süntaksi kvaliteedi, semantilise kauguse ja leksikaalse kauguse järgi. Semantiline kaugus tuletatakse BERT-st ja leksikaalne kvaliteet põhineb GPT2 segadusel. Selle mitmeobjektiivse otsingu probleemi lahendamiseks pakume välja kaks algoritmi: Monte-Carlo puu otsing parafraasi genereerimiseks (MCPG) ja Pareto puu otsing (PTS). Pakume ulatuslikku eksperimentide kogumit viie andmekogumiga, millel on range reprodutseerimine ja valideerimine mitmete kaasaegsete parafraaside genereerimise algoritmide jaoks. Need katsed näitavad, et kuigi meie algoritmid ei ole selgesõnaliselt järelevalve all, toimivad need algoritmid hästi nende lähtejoonte suhtes.', 'fi': 'Tutkimme hakupohjaista parafraasien generointijärjestelmää, jossa parafraasit luodaan iteroiduilla muunnoksilla alkuperäisestä lauseesta ja arvioidaan syntaksin laadun, semanttisen etäisyyden ja leksikaalisen etäisyyden perusteella. Semanttinen etäisyys johdetaan BERT:stä ja leksikaalinen laatu perustuu GPT2:n perplexiteettiin. Tämän monitavoitteisen hakuongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme kahta algoritmia: Monte-Carlo Tree Search For Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) ja Pareto Tree Search (PTS). Tarjoamme laajan joukon kokeita viidellä datajoukolla, joissa toistetaan ja validoidaan useita huippuluokan parafraasien generointialgoritmeja tarkasti. Nämä kokeet osoittavat, että vaikka algoritmit eivät ole nimenomaisesti valvottuja, ne toimivat hyvin näitä perusviivoja vastaan.', 'sk': 'Proučujemo iskalno shemo generiranja parafraz, kjer kandidatne parafraze generirajo s iteriranimi transformacijami iz izvirnega stavka in ocenjujemo v smislu kakovosti sintakse, semantične razdalje in leksikalne razdalje. Semantična razdalja izhaja iz BERT, leksikalna kakovost pa temelji na GPT2 zmedenosti. Za rešitev tega večciljnega iskanja predlagamo dva algoritma: Monte-Carlo Tree Search For Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) in Pareto Tree Search (PTS). Ponujamo obsežen nabor eksperimentov na petih naborih podatkov s strogo reprodukcijo in validacijo več najsodobnejših algoritmov za generiranje parafraz. Ti poskusi kažejo, da naši algoritmi, čeprav niso izrecno nadzorovani, dobro delujejo glede na te osnovne črte.', 'he': 'אנו לומדים מערכת דורת פראפרסמות מבוססת חיפוש שבה פראפרסמות מועמדים יוצרות על ידי שינויים מחוברים מהמשפט המקורי ומעריכים במונחים של איכות סינטקס, מרחק סמנטי, ומרחק לקסיקלי. המרחק הסמנטי מושלם מברט, והאיכות הלקסית מבוססת על התבלבות GPT2. כדי לפתור את בעיית החיפוש הרב-אובייקטיבי הזו, אנו מציעים שני אלגוריתמים: חיפוש עץ מונט-קרלו עבור יצירת פראפרזיה (MCPG) ו חיפוש עץ Pareto (PTS). אנחנו מספקים קבוצה רחבה של ניסויים על 5 קבוצות נתונים עם שיגור ותיקון קשה לכמה אלגוריתמים של דור פראפרזים מצוינים. הניסויים האלה מראים שלמרות שלא מפקחים באופן ברור, האלגוריתמים שלנו מתקדמים היטב נגד השורות הבסיסיות האלה.', 'jv': 'Awakdhéwé pisan winih-basan paraFrase sing dadi nggawe akeh basa paraFrase sing dadi nggawe barang nggawe winih dhéwé basa perusahaan seneng pisan-perusahaan sematik dipundon seneng luwih dumateng BERT, lan akeh luwih-luwih basa ning dipunanggé GP2. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness We nyimpen an expanded set of testing on 5 dataset with a striorous ripping and Valdata for multistate-of-the-arts paraFrench Generation Algorithms. Awak dhéwé éntuk kuwi, nik kabèh ora ngerasakno luwih apik, Algoritmi awak dhéwé ngerasakno iki.', 'ha': "Tuna karatun wani shirin da aka samar da fassarar a kan search-based, inda ake samar da parameters da aka ƙididdige wasu mutane da aka baka shigettori daga maganar farko, kuma ana ƙaddara a cikin sifar sunanta, da nĩsa na semantic, da wuri na leksisi. Gansa na semantic ana samar da shi daga BERT, kuma da sifar leksisi a kan GPT2. @ action: button Tuna samar da jarrabi masu faɗi kan data-set 5, da tsari mai inganci kuma masu inganci wa algoritori masu cikin-state-of-the-art-the-art. Haƙĩƙa, waɗannan jarrabai ke nũna cewa, kuma kõ da ba a zama mai tsaro ba bayyananne, algorityinmu za'a aikata aikin ƙwarai a kangaran waɗannan.", 'bo': 'We study a search-based paraphrase generation scheme where candidate paraphrases are generated by iterated transformations from the original sentence and evaluated in terms of syntax quality, semantic distance, and lexical distance. semantic distance is derived from BERT, and the lexical quality is based on GPT2 perplexity. To solve this multi-objective search problem, we propose two algorithms: Monte-Carlo Tree Search For Paraphrase Generation (MCPG) and Pareto Tree Search (PTS). ང་ཚོས་གནད་སྡུད་གཞུང་ཚབ་ལ་5ལྟ་བུའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལུགས་རྐྱེན་བ་སྤྱོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་འདི་དག་ལ་གསལ་བཤད་མེད་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་རྩིས་གཞི་རྟེན་འདི་དག་ལ་སྐྱོན་བརྟན་ཏེ།'}
{'en': 'FAST : Financial News and Tweet Based Time Aware Network for Stock Trading', 'es': 'FAST: Red de información temporal basada en tweets y noticias financieras para el comercio de acciones', 'ar': 'سريع: الأخبار المالية والشبكة المدركة للوقت المستندة إلى التغريدات لتداول الأسهم', 'fr': "FAST\xa0: Réseau de gestion du temps basé sur les actualités financières et les tweets pour la négociation d'actions", 'pt': 'FAST: Notícias financeiras e rede de conhecimento de tempo baseada em tweets para negociação de ações', 'zh': 'FAST曰:财经新闻基于推文,网络于股票交易', 'ja': 'FAST: Financial News and Tweet Based Time Aware Network for Stock Trading', 'ru': 'FAST: Сеть финансовых новостей и твитов на основе времени для торговли акциями', 'hi': 'फास्ट: वित्तीय समाचार और चहचहाना शेयर ट्रेडिंग के लिए समय जागरूक नेटवर्क आधारित', 'ga': 'FAST: Líonra Feasacht Ama Bunaithe ar Nuacht Airgeadais agus Tweet do Thrádáil Stoc', 'el': 'Γρήγορα: Χρηματοοικονομικά Νέα και Δίκτυο Χρονοδιάγνωσης για τις συναλλαγές μετοχών', 'ka': 'FAST: ფინანციალური ახალგაზები და Tweet Based Time Aware Network for Stock Trading', 'hu': 'FAST: Pénzügyi hírek és Tweet alapú időtudatos hálózat a részvénykereskedéshez', 'kk': 'FAST: Қаржылық жаңалықтар және Tweet негіздеген уақытты қарау желісі Stock Trading үшін', 'it': 'FAST: Notizie finanziarie e Tweet Basati sul Time Aware Network per il trading azionario', 'mk': 'FAST: Financial News and Tweet Based Time Aware Network for Stock Trading', 'ml': 'ഫാസ്റ്റ്: ഫാന്\u200dസിക്കല്\u200d വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള നിശ്ചിത വാര്\u200dത്തകളും ടൂട്ടിയുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ സമയം അറി', 'mn': 'ФАСТ: Санхүүгийн мэдээлэл, Tweet Based Time Aware Network for Stock Trading', 'mt': 'FAST: Netwerk ta’ Għarfien dwar Ħin ibbażat fuq l-Aħbarijiet Finanzjarji u t-Tweet għall-Iskambju tal-istokkijiet', 'ms': 'FAST: Rangkaian Awas Berita Kewangan dan Waktu Berasas Tweet untuk Perdagangan Stok', 'lt': 'FAST: Finansinių naujienų ir dviejų pranešimų apie laiką tinklas, skirtas prekybai vertybiniais popieriais', 'ro': 'FAST: Știri financiare și Tweet Bazate pe Time Aware Network pentru tranzacționarea acțiunilor', 'pl': 'Szybko: Wiadomości finansowe i Tweet oparta na czasie sieć dla handlu akcjami', 'no': 'FAST: Finansielle nyhetar og Tweet-basert tidsbasert nettverk for Stock Trading', 'sr': 'FAST: Financijska vijest i Tweet-Based Time Aware Network for Stock Trading', 'sv': 'FAST: Finansiella nyheter och Tweet baserat tidsmedvetet nätverk för aktiehandel', 'si': 'FAST: විත්\u200dයාත්මක වාර්තාව සහ ට්විට් අධාරිත වාර්තාව සඳහා ස්ටෝක් ට්\u200dරේඩින්ග් වෙනුවෙන්', 'so': 'FAST: Hababka dhaqaalaha iyo Tweet-based Time Known Network for Trading', 'ta': 'பாஸ்ட்: நிதி செய்தி மற்றும் தொடர்பு அடிப்படையான நேரம் அறிவிப்பு வலைப்பின்னல்', 'ur': 'فاسٹ: فنانسی خبریں اور ٹویٹ بنیاد وقت Aware Network for Stock Trading', 'uz': 'FAST: Fayl yangi xabar va Twitterning asosiy vaqt haqida maʼlumot tarmoq', 'vi': 'Bộ Tin Tài Chính và Bộ Báo Báo giờ dựa trên bộ giao dịch chứng khoán', 'nl': 'SNEL: Financieel Nieuws en Tweet Gebaseerd Time Aware Netwerk voor aandelenhandel', 'da': 'FAST: Finansielle nyheder og Tweet baseret tidsbevidst netværk for aktiehandel', 'bg': 'Бързо: Финансови новини и мрежа за търговия с акции', 'hr': 'FAST: Financijska vijest i Tweet-Based Time Aware Network za prodaju dionica', 'ko': 'F.A.S.T.: 금융 뉴스 및 트위터 기반 주식 거래 시간 감지 네트워크', 'fa': 'FAST: خبرهای مالی و توئیت بر اساس شبکه زمان آگاهی برای تجارت صندوق', 'id': 'FAST: News Financial and Tweet Based Time Aware Network for Stock Trading', 'de': 'FAST: Finanznachrichten und Tweet Based Time Aware Network für den Aktienhandel', 'sw': 'FAST: Habari za kifedha na mtandao wa Twita wa Kufahamika kwa ajili ya biashara ya Stock label', 'tr': 'FAST: Mali Haberleri ve Tweet Based Time Aware Network for Stock Trading', 'af': 'FAST: Finansiele Nuus en Tweet Based Time Aware Netwerk vir Stoor Trading', 'sq': 'FAST: Financial News and Tweet Based Time Aware Network for Stock Trading', 'am': 'FAST: የሀብት ዜና እና የTweet Based Time Known Network for Trading', 'az': 'FAST: Financial News and Tweet Based Time Aware Network for Stock Trading', 'bn': 'ফ্যাস্ট: অর্থনৈতিক সংবাদ এবং টুইটের ভিত্তিক সময় সংক্রান্ত নেটওয়ার্ক', 'hy': 'ՖԱՍՏ. Ֆինանսական նորությունները և Թվիթ հիմնված ժամանակի գիտակցության ցանցը', 'bs': 'FAST: Financijska vijest i Tweet-Based Time Aware Network za prodaju dionica', 'ca': 'FAST: Financial News and Tweet-based Time Aware Network for Stock Trading', 'cs': 'Rychle: Finanční zprávy a síť založená na čase pro obchodování s akciemi', 'et': 'Kiiresti: Finantsuudised ja Tweet-põhine ajateadlik võrgustik aktsiatega kauplemiseks', 'fi': 'FAST: Talousuutiset ja Tweet-pohjainen Time Aware Network osakekaupalle', 'ha': 'FATATA: Networkspace for Trading', 'sk': 'Hitro: Finančne novice in mreža za trgovanje z delnicami, ki temelji na Tweet-ih', 'jv': 'FILE: Finance Noties lan Tuet basa Time Away Network kanggo Stock Trading', 'bo': 'FAST: དངུལ་འབྲེལ་བ། དངུལ་འབྲེལ་བ། Tweet Based Time Aware Network for Stock Trading', 'he': 'FAST: חדשות פיננסיות וטוויט רשת מודעות לזמן מסחר במניות'}
{'en': 'Designing profitable trading strategies is complex as stock movements are highly stochastic ; the market is influenced by large volumes of noisy data across diverse information sources like news and social media. Prior work mostly treats stock movement prediction as a regression or classification task and is not directly optimized towards profit-making. Further, they do not model the fine-grain temporal irregularities in the release of vast volumes of text that the market responds to quickly. Building on these limitations, we propose a novel hierarchical, learning to rank approach that uses textual data to make time-aware predictions for ranking stocks based on expected profit. Our approach outperforms state-of-the-art methods by over 8 % in terms of cumulative profit and risk-adjusted returns in trading simulations on two benchmarks : English tweets and Chinese financial news spanning two major stock indexes and four global markets. Through ablative and qualitative analyses, we build the case for our method as a tool for daily stock trading.', 'ar': 'يعد تصميم استراتيجيات تداول مربحة أمرًا معقدًا نظرًا لأن تحركات الأسهم شديدة التعقيد ؛ يتأثر السوق بكميات كبيرة من البيانات الصاخبة عبر مصادر المعلومات المتنوعة مثل الأخبار ووسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. يتعامل العمل السابق في الغالب مع التنبؤ بحركة المخزون على أنه مهمة انحدار أو تصنيف ولا يتم تحسينه بشكل مباشر لتحقيق الربح. علاوة على ذلك ، فهم لا يضعون نموذجًا للمخالفات الزمنية الدقيقة في إصدار كميات هائلة من النصوص التي يستجيب لها السوق بسرعة. بناءً على هذه القيود ، نقترح نهجًا هرميًا جديدًا ، يتعلم منهج الترتيب الذي يستخدم البيانات النصية لعمل تنبؤات مدركة للوقت لترتيب الأسهم بناءً على الربح المتوقع. يتفوق نهجنا على أحدث الأساليب بأكثر من 8٪ من حيث الأرباح التراكمية والعوائد المعدلة حسب المخاطر في محاكاة التداول على معيارين: التغريدات باللغة الإنجليزية والأخبار المالية الصينية التي تغطي مؤشرين رئيسيين للأسهم وأربعة أسواق عالمية. من خلال التحليلات الوصفية والنوعية ، فإننا نبني الحالة لطريقتنا كأداة للتداول اليومي في الأسهم.', 'fr': "La conception de stratégies de trading rentables est complexe car les mouvements boursiers sont très stochastiques\xa0; le marché est influencé par de grands volumes de données bruyantes provenant de diverses sources d'information telles que les actualités et les médias sociaux. Les travaux antérieurs traitent principalement la prévision des mouvements de stock comme une tâche de régression ou de classification et ne sont pas directement optimisées pour la recherche de profits. De plus, ils ne modélisent pas les irrégularités temporelles fines dans la publication de grands volumes de texte auxquelles le marché répond rapidement. En nous appuyant sur ces limites, nous proposons une nouvelle approche hiérarchique d'apprentissage du classement qui utilise des données textuelles pour faire des prévisions temporelles pour le classement des actions en fonction du profit attendu. Notre approche surpasse les méthodes de pointe de plus de 8\xa0% en termes de bénéfices cumulés et de rendements ajustés au risque dans les simulations de trading sur deux indices de référence\xa0: les tweets en anglais et les actualités financières chinoises couvrant deux principaux indices boursiers et quatre marchés mondiaux. Grâce à des analyses ablatives et qualitatives, nous justifions notre méthode en tant qu'outil de négociation d'actions quotidiennes.", 'pt': 'Projetar estratégias de negociação lucrativas é complexo, pois os movimentos das ações são altamente estocásticos; o mercado é influenciado por grandes volumes de dados ruidosos em diversas fontes de informação, como notícias e mídias sociais. O trabalho anterior trata principalmente a previsão de movimento de ações como uma tarefa de regressão ou classificação e não é diretamente otimizada para fins lucrativos. Além disso, eles não modelam as irregularidades temporais refinadas na liberação de grandes volumes de texto às quais o mercado responde rapidamente. Com base nessas limitações, propomos uma nova abordagem hierárquica, aprendendo a classificar, que usa dados textuais para fazer previsões com reconhecimento de tempo para classificar ações com base no lucro esperado. Nossa abordagem supera os métodos de última geração em mais de 8% em termos de lucro cumulativo e retornos ajustados ao risco em simulações de negociação em dois benchmarks: tweets em inglês e notícias financeiras chinesas abrangendo dois principais índices de ações e quatro mercados globais. Por meio de análises ablativas e qualitativas, construímos o caso do nosso método como ferramenta para negociação diária de ações.', 'es': 'Diseñar estrategias comerciales rentables es complejo, ya que los movimientos de las acciones son muy estocásticos; el mercado está influenciado por grandes volúmenes de datos ruidosos en diversas fuentes de información, como noticias y redes sociales. Los trabajos anteriores tratan principalmente la predicción de movimientos bursátiles como una tarea de regresión o clasificación y no se optimiza directamente para obtener beneficios. Además, no modelan las irregularidades temporales de grano fino en la publicación de grandes volúmenes de texto a los que el mercado responde rápidamente. Sobre la base de estas limitaciones, proponemos un novedoso enfoque jerárquico de aprendizaje de clasificación que utiliza datos textuales para hacer predicciones con tiempo para clasificar las acciones en función del beneficio esperado. Nuestro enfoque supera a los métodos más avanzados en más de un 8% en términos de beneficios acumulados y rendimientos ajustados al riesgo en simulaciones de negociación en dos puntos de referencia: tuits en inglés y noticias financieras chinas que abarcan dos índices bursátiles principales y cuatro mercados globales. A través de análisis ablativos y cualitativos, defendemos nuestro método como una herramienta para la negociación diaria de acciones.', 'ja': '収益性の高い取引戦略の設計は、株式の動きが非常に確率的であるため複雑です。市場は、ニュースやソーシャルメディアなどの多様な情報源にわたる大量の騒音データの影響を受けています。 以前の仕事は、ほとんどの場合、株式の動きの予測を回帰または分類タスクとして扱い、収益化に向けて直接最適化されていません。 さらに、市場が迅速に対応する膨大な量のテキストのリリースにおける細かい時間的不規則性をモデル化していません。 これらの限界に基づいて、テキストデータを使用して、予想利益に基づいて株式のランキングを予測する斬新な階層的学習アプローチを提案します。 当社のアプローチは、2つのベンチマーク（英語のツイートと2つの主要な株式指数と4つのグローバル市場にわたる中国の金融ニュース）に基づく取引シミュレーションで、累積利益とリスク調整済みリターンの観点で最先端の方法を8 ％以上上回っています。 アブレーション分析と定性分析を通じて、毎日の株式取引のツールとしてのメソッドのケースを構築します。', 'zh': '计利交易之策杂,股票走势高随机也。 市受新闻社交媒体诸息所从来者甚众。 前事要以股票走势占为归分,非直针盈利优化。 此外无大应于市者,文本发中细粒度日月不规则性建模。 凡此诸限,立新颖之分,习排名之法,用文数感占,以次股票期利。 两准模拟,积利调和,优于先进过8%,英语推文越二要股票指数与四全球市中国财经新闻。 烧蚀定性分析,以为常股票交易之具。', 'hi': 'लाभदायक ट्रेडिंग रणनीतियों को डिजाइन करना जटिल है क्योंकि स्टॉक आंदोलनों अत्यधिक स्टोकेस्टिक हैं; बाजार समाचार और सामाजिक मीडिया जैसे विविध सूचना स्रोतों में शोर डेटा की बड़ी मात्रा से प्रभावित होता है। पूर्व कार्य ज्यादातर एक प्रतिगमन या वर्गीकरण कार्य के रूप में स्टॉक आंदोलन की भविष्यवाणी का इलाज करता है और सीधे लाभ कमाने की दिशा में अनुकूलित नहीं है। इसके अलावा, वे पाठ की विशाल मात्रा की रिहाई में ठीक अनाज अस्थायी अनियमितताओं को मॉडल नहीं करते हैं जो बाजार जल्दी से प्रतिक्रिया करता है। इन सीमाओं पर निर्माण करते हुए, हम एक उपन्यास पदानुक्रमित का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, रैंक दृष्टिकोण सीखते हैं जो अपेक्षित लाभ के आधार पर रैंकिंग स्टॉक के लिए समय-जागरूक भविष्यवाणियां करने के लिए पाठ्य डेटा का उपयोग करता है। हमारा दृष्टिकोण दो बेंचमार्क पर ट्रेडिंग सिमुलेशन में संचयी लाभ और जोखिम-समायोजित रिटर्न के मामले में 8% से अधिक अत्याधुनिक तरीकों से बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है: अंग्रेजी ट्वीट्स और चीनी वित्तीय समाचार दो प्रमुख स्टॉक इंडेक्स और चार वैश्विक बाजारों में फैले हुए हैं। ablative और गुणात्मक विश्लेषण के माध्यम से, हम दैनिक स्टॉक ट्रेडिंग के लिए एक उपकरण के रूप में हमारी विधि के लिए मामले का निर्माण करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Разработка прибыльных торговых стратегий является сложной задачей, так как движение акций характеризуется высокой стохастичностью; на рынок влияют большие объемы шумных данных из различных источников информации, таких как новости и социальные сети. Предыдущая работа в основном рассматривает прогнозирование движения акций как задачу регрессии или классификации и непосредственно не оптимизирована для получения прибыли. Кроме того, они не моделируют мелкие временные нарушения при выпуске огромных объемов текста, на которые рынок реагирует быстро. Основываясь на этих ограничениях, мы предлагаем новый иерархический подход к обучению ранжированию, который использует текстовые данные для составления прогнозов по времени для ранжирования акций на основе ожидаемой прибыли. Наш подход опережает современные методы более чем на 8% с точки зрения совокупной прибыли и скорректированной на риск доходности в торговых симуляциях по двум критериям: английские твиты и китайские финансовые новости, охватывающие два основных фондовых индекса и четыре глобальных рынка. Благодаря абляционному и качественному анализу мы создаем обоснование нашего метода в качестве инструмента для ежедневной торговли акциями.', 'ga': 'Tá sé casta straitéisí trádála brabúsacha a dhearadh mar go bhfuil gluaiseachtaí stoic thar a bheith stochastic; tá tionchar ag líon mór sonraí torannacha ar fud foinsí éagsúla faisnéise amhail nuacht agus na meáin shóisialta ar an margadh. Déileálann réamhobair den chuid is mó le tuar gluaiseachta stoic mar thasc aischéimnithe nó rangaithe agus ní dhéantar í a bharrfheabhsú go díreach chun brabús a dhéanamh. Ina theannta sin, ní mhúnlaíonn siad na neamhrialtachtaí ama mionghráin maidir le méideanna ollmhóra téacs a eisiúint a bhfreagraíonn an margadh dóibh go tapa. Ag tógáil ar na teorainneacha sin, molaimid cur chuige ordlathach nua, ag foghlaim conas rangú a dhéanamh, a úsáideann sonraí téacsúla chun réamh-mheastacháin ama a dhéanamh maidir le stoic a rangú bunaithe ar an mbrabús tuartha. Sáraíonn ár gcur chuige modhanna úrscothacha breis agus 8% i dtéarmaí brabúis charnacha agus torthaí coigeartaithe riosca in insamhaltaí trádála ar dhá thagarmharc: tweets Béarla agus nuacht airgeadais na Síne a chuimsíonn dhá mhór-innéacs stoic agus ceithre mhargadh domhanda. Trí anailísí cainníochtúla agus cáilíochtúla, cuirimid an cás le haghaidh ár modh mar uirlis le haghaidh stoc trádála laethúil.', 'el': 'Ο σχεδιασμός κερδοφόρων στρατηγικών συναλλαγών είναι πολύπλοκος καθώς οι κινήσεις μετοχών είναι ιδιαίτερα στοχαστικές. η αγορά επηρεάζεται από μεγάλους όγκους θορυβωδών δεδομένων σε διάφορες πηγές πληροφοριών, όπως ειδήσεις και μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Η προηγούμενη εργασία αντιμετωπίζει κυρίως την πρόβλεψη κίνησης μετοχών ως μια εργασία παλινδρόμησης ή ταξινόμησης και δεν βελτιστοποιείται άμεσα προς την επίτευξη κέρδους. Επιπλέον, δεν μοντελοποιούν τις λεπτόκοκκες χρονικές παρατυπίες στην κυκλοφορία τεράστιων όγκων κειμένου στις οποίες ανταποκρίνεται γρήγορα η αγορά. Βασιζόμενοι σε αυτούς τους περιορισμούς, προτείνουμε μια νέα ιεραρχική προσέγγιση που χρησιμοποιεί δεδομένα κειμένου για να κάνει προβλέψεις για την κατάταξη μετοχών με βάση το αναμενόμενο κέρδος. Η προσέγγισή μας ξεπερνά τις σύγχρονες μεθόδους κατά πάνω από 8% όσον αφορά το σωρευτικό κέρδος και τις προσαρμοσμένες στον κίνδυνο αποδόσεις σε προσομοιώσεις συναλλαγών σε δύο σημεία αναφοράς: Αγγλικά tweets και κινεζικά χρηματοοικονομικά νέα που καλύπτουν δύο σημαντικούς δείκτες μετοχών και τέσσερις παγκόσμιες αγορές. Μέσα από αφαιρετικές και ποιοτικές αναλύσεις, στηρίζουμε τη μέθοδο μας ως εργαλείο καθημερινής διαπραγμάτευσης μετοχών.', 'hu': 'A nyereséges kereskedési stratégiák kialakítása bonyolult, mivel a részvénymozgások rendkívül sztochasztikusak; a piacot nagy mennyiségű zajos adat befolyásolja különböző információforrásokból, például a hírekből és a közösségi médiából. A korábbi munkák leginkább regressziós vagy osztályozási feladatként kezelik a részvénymozgások előrejelzését, és nem optimalizálják közvetlenül a nyereségtermelésre. Ezenkívül nem modellezik a finomszemű időbeli szabálytalanságokat a piac gyorsan reagáló hatalmas mennyiségű szöveg kiadásában. Ezekre a korlátozásokra építve egy új hierarchikus, rangsorolási megközelítést javasolunk, amely szöveges adatokat használ arra, hogy időtudatos előrejelzéseket készítsen a részvények rangsorolására a várható nyereség alapján. Megközelítésünk több mint 8%-kal felülmúlja a legkorszerűbb módszereket a kumulatív nyereség és a kockázattal korrigált hozamok tekintetében a kereskedési szimulációkban két referenciaértéken: angol tweetek és kínai pénzügyi hírek két fő részvényindexre és négy globális piacra kiterjedő. Ablatív és minőségi elemzésekkel építjük fel a módszerünket, mint a napi részvénykereskedés eszközét.', 'it': "Progettare strategie di trading redditizie è complesso in quanto i movimenti delle azioni sono altamente stocastici; il mercato è influenzato da grandi volumi di dati rumorosi attraverso diverse fonti di informazione come notizie e social media. I lavori precedenti trattano principalmente la previsione del movimento azionario come un'attività di regressione o classificazione e non è direttamente ottimizzata verso il profitto. Inoltre, non modellano le irregolarità temporali a grana fine nella pubblicazione di grandi volumi di testo a cui il mercato risponde rapidamente. Partendo da queste limitazioni, proponiamo un nuovo approccio gerarchico, imparando a classificare, che utilizza dati testuali per fare previsioni consapevoli del tempo per classificare le azioni in base al profitto atteso. Il nostro approccio supera i metodi all'avanguardia di oltre l'8% in termini di profitti cumulativi e rendimenti corretti per il rischio nelle simulazioni di trading su due benchmark: tweet inglesi e notizie finanziarie cinesi su due principali indici azionari e quattro mercati globali. Attraverso analisi ablative e qualitative, costruiamo il caso del nostro metodo come strumento per il trading giornaliero di azioni.", 'ka': 'პოვნტაქტიური სამყარო სტრატიგიების განაზღვრება კომპლექსია, რადგან stock movements are highly stochastic; მაზარტი უფრო დიდი მონაცემების მონაცემებით განსხვავებული ინფორმაციის ფოსტურებში, როგორც ნუტურები და სოციალური მედიაში. პირველი სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო მოძრაობის წარმოდგენება როგორც რეგრესია ან კლასიფიკაციის სამუშაო და არ არის პირველ ოპტიმიზებ დამატებით, ისინი არ მოდელურებენ თავსუფალური irregularitiები ტექსტის დიდი volumes გახსნა, რომელიც ბაზეტი წინასწარმოადგენს. ამ ზომილებების შესახებ ჩვენ პრომენტის ჰიერაქტიკური, სწავლობა, რომელიც ტექსტულ მონაცემების გამოყენება, რომელიც დავიყენებთ მონაცემების წარმოდგენები, რომელიც მომეხოვრებ ჩვენი პროგორმაცია კუმულატიური პოვიქტის და რისკულატიური კომულატიური სიმულაციების შესახებ ორი ბენქმარკზე გავაკეთება: ანგლისური tweets და ჩინეთის ფინასური ნუზები, რომლებიც ორი მნიშვნელოვანი stock ინდექსის და ოთხი ბლადჲეაპნთ თ კგალთრართგნთ ანალთჱთ ჟმვ ნაოპაგთლთ ჟლსფაი ჱა ნაქთწ მვრჲე კარჲ ოჲმჲღ ჱა ენვზნთ ჟოაპეთ.', 'lt': 'Designing profitable trading strategies is complex as stock movements are highly stochastic;  rinkai įtakos daro didelis įvairių informacijos šaltinių, pavyzdžiui, naujienų ir socialinės žiniasklaidos, triukšmingų duomenų kiekis. Ankstesnis darbas daugiausia vertina atsargų judėjimo prognozę kaip regresijos ar klasifikacijos užduotį ir nėra tiesiogiai optimizuotas pelno siekimui. Further, they do not model the fine-grain temporal irregularities in the release of vast volumes of text that the market responds to quickly.  Remdamiesi šiais apribojimais, siūlome naują hierarchinį požiūrį, mokytis klasifikuoti metodą, kuris naudoja tekstinius duomenis, kad laiku būtų galima prognozuoti atsargų klasifikavimą pagal tikėtiną pelną. Mūsų požiūris viršija pažangiausius metodus daugiau kaip 8 proc. bendram pelnui ir pagal riziką pakoreguotai grąžai modeliuojant prekybą pagal du lyginamuosius rodiklius: anglų tweetus ir Kinijos finansines naujienas, apimančias du pagrindinius akcijų indeksus ir keturias pasaulines rinkas. Atliekant ablatyvias ir kokybines analizes, sukuriame savo metodą kaip kasdienės prekybos vertybiniais popieriais priemonę.', 'kk': 'Қызықты тәртіптер стратегиясын құрастыру көпшілікті, бұл көпшілік жылжытудың көпшілігі жеткілікті. маркет жаңалық және социаллық медиақтар секілді көптеген мәлімет көзінде үлкен дыбыс мәліметтер көзінде әсер етеді. Алдыңғы жұмыс көпшілігінің көпшілігі бағдарламаларды регрессия не классификациялау тапсырмасы ретінде белгілейді, және қарым құрылғысына тәртіпті оптими Келесіден бұл жерде, маркеттің тез жауап беретін мәтіндің көп тобының шығаруындағы уақытша тәртіпсіздіктерін үлгілемейді. Бұл шектеулерді қолдану үшін жаңа иерархикалық, мәтіндік деректерді қолдану үшін, күтпеген ашыққа негізделген сабақтар үшін уақытты түсінікті бағалау үшін оқыту үшін, жаңа иерарх Біздің тәсіліміздің күй- жай әдістеріміз 8% арқылы көптеген жұмыс және тәуелсіздің түзету симуляцияларында екі бағдарламалардың тәртібінде қайтарылған қайтаруларды жасайды: ағылшын tweets және қытайлық финансовы жаң Активті және кәдімгі анализ арқылы бұл әдісті күнделік сақтау құралы ретінде құрамыз.', 'mk': 'Дизајнирањето на профитабилни трговски стратегии е комплексно, бидејќи движењата на акциите се високо стокастични; the market is influenced by large volumes of noisy data across diverse information sources like news and social media.  Претходната работа главно ги третира предвидувањата на движењето на акциите како регресија или класификација задача и не е директно оптимизирана кон профитот. Покрај тоа, тие не ги моделираат привремените нерегуларности во објавувањето на огромни количини текст на кои пазарот брзо одговара. Користејќи ги овие ограничувања, предложуваме нова хиерархиска, учење да се рангира пристапот кој користи текстуални податоци за да се направат временски предвидувања за рангирање на акциите врз основа на очекуваниот профит. Нашиот пристап ги надминува најсовремените методи за повеќе од 8 отсто во однос на кумулативниот профит и ризично прилагодените приходи во трговските симулации на два референтни значки: англиските твитови и кинеските финансиски вести кои вклучуваат два главни индекси на акциите и четири глоб Преку аблативни и квалитетни анализи, го изградуваме случајот за нашиот метод како алат за секојдневна трговија со акции.', 'ml': 'ലാഭകരമായ വ്യാപാരത്തിന്റെ ട്രാക്ട്രിക്കേറ്റികള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നത് സ്റ്റോക്ക് നീക്കങ്ങള്\u200d വളര വ്യത്യസ്ത വിവരങ്ങളിലുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സ്രോതസ്സുകള്\u200dക്കും വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചും മാര്\u200dക്കറ്റില്\u200d വലിയ ശബ്ദ വിവരങ്ങള Prior work mostly treats stock movement prediction as a regression or classification task and is not directly optimized towards profit-making.  അതിനുശേഷം, മാര്\u200dക്കറ്റ് വേഗത്തില്\u200d ഉത്തരം പറയുന്ന വാചകങ്ങളുടെ വിട്ടുമാറ്റുന്നതിന്റെ വിശാലമായ പദാവലിയുടെ വിധികള്\u200d അവര്\u200d നല ഈ പരിധികളില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിനു വേണ്ടി നോവല്\u200d ഹിയെരാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത് പ്രതീക്ഷിക നമ്മുടെ അടുത്തുനിന്നുള്ള മാര്\u200dഗ്ഗങ്ങള്\u200d 8% കൂടുതല്\u200d സ്ഥിതിയായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. കൂമുളേറ്റീവ് ലാഭങ്ങളും അപകടത്തിന് മാറ്റങ്ങളുമായി തിരിച്ചറിയുന് സാധ്യതയുള്ള വിശദീകരണവും കൊണ്ട്, നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നത് ദിവസവും സ്റ്റോക', 'ms': 'Designing profitable trading strategies is complex as stock movements are highly stochastic;  pasar dipengaruhi oleh volum besar data bunyi melalui sumber maklumat berbeza seperti berita dan media sosial. Kerja terdahulu kebanyakan menganggap ramalan pergerakan stok sebagai tugas regresi atau klasifikasi dan tidak secara langsung optimasi ke arah pembuat keuntungan. Lagipun, mereka tidak memmodelkan ketidakadilan sementara gandum halus dalam pembebasan volum besar teks yang pasar bertindak cepat. Membangun pada keterangan-keterangan ini, kami cadangkan hierarkis baru, belajar untuk menandai pendekatan yang menggunakan data teks untuk membuat ramalan masa-sedar untuk menandai stok berdasarkan keuntungan yang dijangka. Pendekatan kita melebihi kaedah terbaik dengan lebih dari 8% dalam terma keuntungan kumulatif dan keuntungan disesuaikan risiko dalam simulasi perdagangan pada dua tanda referensi: tweet Inggeris dan berita kewangan Cina yang meliputi dua indeks saham utama dan empat pasar global. Melalui analisis ablatif dan kualitatif, kami membina kes untuk kaedah kami sebagai alat untuk perdagangan saham sehari-hari.', 'mt': 'It-tfassil ta’ strateġiji kummerċjali profittabbli huwa kumpless peress li l-movimenti tal-ishma huma stokastiċi ħafna; is-suq huwa influwenzat minn volumi kbar ta’ dejta storbjuża minn sorsi differenti ta’ informazzjoni bħall-aħbarijiet u l-midja soċjali. Ix-xogħol preċedenti jittratta l-aktar it-tbassir tal-moviment tal-istokk bħala xogħol ta’ rigressjoni jew klassifikazzjoni u mhuwiex direttament ottimizzat lejn il-qligħ. Barra minn hekk, ma jimmudellawx l-irregolaritajiet temporali tal-ħbub fin fir-rilaxx ta’ volumi kbar ta’ test li s-suq jirrispondi għalihom malajr. Filwaqt li nibnu fuq dawn il-limitazzjonijiet, nipproponu approċċ ġerarkiku ġdid, li jitgħallem jikklassifika li juża dejta testwali biex jagħmel previżjonijiet konxji taż-żmien għall-ikklassifikar tal-istokkijiet ibbażati fuq il-profitt mistenni. L-approċċ tagħna jaqbeż il-metodi l-aktar avvanzati b’aktar minn 8 % f’termini ta’ profitt kumulattiv u qligħ aġġustat għar-riskju fis-simulazzjonijiet tan-negozjar fuq żewġ punti ta’ riferiment: tweets Ingliżi u aħbarijiet finanzjarji Ċiniżi li jkopru żewġ indiċi ewlenin tal-ishma u erba’ swieq globali. Permezz ta’ analiżi ablativa u kwalitattiva, a ħna nibnu l-każ għall-metodu tagħna bħala għodda għall-iskambju ta’ kuljum tal-ishma.', 'mn': 'Ажил ашигтай худалдааны стратегийг загварчлах нь худалдааны хөдөлгөөн нь маш чухал байдаг. зах зээл мэдээлэл болон нийгмийн мэдээлэл зэрэг олон чимээгүй мэдээлэл дээр нөлөөлдөг. Эхний ажил ихэнхдээ хөдөлгөөн хөдөлгөөний таамаглал нь сэтгэл хөдөлгөөн эсвэл хуваалцах үйл ажиллагаа гэж үздэг. Тэгээд ашиг үйлдвэрлэхэд шууд хангалттай байхгүй. Дараа нь, тэд зах зээлийн хурдан хариулж буй олон хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний буруу загварыг загварчлахгүй. Эдгээр хязгаарлалууд дээр байгуулахад бид шинэ архитектур, мөнгө өгөгдлийг ашиглаж, хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдсөн ашиг дээр зарцуулахын тулд цаг хугацааны хугацааны таамаглалтыг ашиглах шинэ архитектур Бидний арга хэмжээний хувьд худалдааны шинжлэх ухааны хувьд 2 давхар давхар шинжлэх ухаан дээр нийтлэл ашиг, эрсдэлтэй холбогдолтой худалдааны шинжлэх ухааны хувьд 8%-аас илүү үржүүлдэг: Англи tweets, Хятад санхүүгийн мэдээг хоёр Өдөр тутмын худалдааны хэрэгсэл болон чадвартай судалгаагаар бид үүнийг өдөр тутмын худалдааны хэрэгсэл болгон бүтээж байна.', 'no': 'Designing of profitable trading strategies is complex as stock movements are highly stochastic; and markedet påvirkar av stor volum støyrande data over ulike informasjonskjelder som nyhetar og sosiale media. Førre arbeid behandler hovudsakelig forhåndsvising av stokkflytting som regresjon eller klassifikasjonsverkt og er ikkje direkte optimalisert mot forhåndsvising. Dei modeller ikkje tidsstyrre ulikheten av finkrone i utlysinga av store volum av tekst som markedet svarar på raskt. Med å bygge på desse grensene, foreslår vi eit nytt hierarkisk, læring til å rankera tilnærming som brukar tekstualdata for å gjera tidsverdi for å rankera stokkar basert på forventa profit. Tilnærminga vårt utfører kunstmetodane med over 8 % ved høve til kumulative profit og risikokorganiserte returnering i tradisjonssimulasjonar på to benchmarker: engelsk tweets og kinesisk finansielle nyhetar som utvidar to store stokkindekser og fire globale markeder. Gjennom aktive og kvalitative analyser, bygger vi tilfellet for metoden vårt som verktøy for daglige stokktradisjon.', 'pl': 'Projektowanie zyskownych strategii handlowych jest złożone, ponieważ ruchy akcji są wysoce stochastyczne; na rynek wpływa duża ilość hałaśliwych danych w różnych źródłach informacji, takich jak wiadomości i media społecznościowe. Wcześniejsze prace traktują głównie przewidywanie ruchu akcji jako zadanie regresji lub klasyfikacji i nie są bezpośrednio zoptymalizowane w kierunku osiągania zysków. Ponadto nie modelują one drobnoziarnistych nieprawidłowości czasowych w uwalnianiu ogromnych ilości tekstu, na które rynek szybko reaguje. Opierając się na tych ograniczeniach, proponujemy nowe hierarchiczne, nauczące się rankować podejście, które wykorzystuje dane tekstowe do sporządzania świadomych czasu prognoz rankingu akcji w oparciu o oczekiwany zysk. Nasze podejście przewyższa najnowocześniejsze metody o ponad 8% pod względem skumulowanego zysku i zwrotu skorygowanego ryzykiem w symulacjach handlowych na dwóch punktach odniesienia: angielskich tweetach i chińskich wiadomościach finansowych obejmujących dwa główne indeksy akcji i cztery rynki globalne. Poprzez analizy ablacyjne i jakościowe budujemy argumenty dla naszej metody jako narzędzia codziennego handlu akcjami.', 'ro': 'Proiectarea strategiilor profitabile de tranzacționare este complexă, deoarece mișcările acțiunilor sunt extrem de stocastice; piața este influențată de volume mari de date zgomotoase din diverse surse de informații, cum ar fi știrile și rețelele sociale. Lucrările anterioare tratează în principal predicția mișcării stocurilor ca o sarcină de regresie sau clasificare și nu este optimizată direct spre obținerea de profit. În plus, acestea nu modelează neregulile temporale cu granule fine în lansarea unor volume mari de text la care piața răspunde rapid. Bazându-ne pe aceste limitări, propunem o nouă abordare ierarhică, care învăță să rangeze, care utilizează date textuale pentru a face previziuni conștiente de timp pentru clasificarea stocurilor pe baza profitului așteptat. Abordarea noastră depășește metodele de ultimă generație cu peste 8% în ceea ce privește profitul cumulat și randamentul ajustat la risc în simulările de tranzacționare pe două criterii de referință: tweet-uri în limba engleză și știri financiare chinezești care cuprind doi indici majori de acțiuni și patru piețe globale. Prin analize ablative și calitative, construim cazul metodei noastre ca instrument pentru tranzacționarea zilnică a acțiunilor.', 'sr': 'Dizajniranje profitabilnih trgovinskih strategija je kompleksno jer su kretanje dionica vrlo stokastična; tržište utiče veliki volumi buknih podataka u raznim izvorima informacija poput vesti i društvenih medija. Prije posla uglavnom tretira predviđanje pokreta dionica kao regresiju ili klasifikaciju i nije direktno optimiziran prema zaradi profit a. Dalje, oni ne modeluju privremene nepravilnosti finog zrnca u oslobađanju ogromnih voluma teksta na koje tržište brzo reagira. Na temelju tih ograničenja, predlažemo novu hijerarhičku, učenje za rankiranje pristupa koji koristi tekstualne podatke kako bi napravili predviđanja svjesnog vremena za rankiranje stokova na osnovu očekivanog profit a. Naš pristup iznosi metode države umjetnosti preko 8% u smislu kumulativnog profita i prilagođenih povratka rizika u simulacijama trgovine na dva kritika: engleske tweets i kineske finansijske vijesti koje šire dve velike indekse dionica i četiri globalne tržišta. Kroz aktivne i kvalitativne analize, izgradili smo slučaj za našu metodu kao alat za dnevnu trgovinu dionicama.', 'so': "Designing profitable trading strategies is complex as stock movements are highly stochastic;  suuqa waxaa saameyn ku yeelanaya macluumaadyo badan oo kala duduwan sida warbixinta iyo mitandada bulshada. Shaqoda hore inta badan waxaa loo baaraandegayaa wax la soo celiyo ama iskuul ahaan, si toos ah looma tixgeliyo wax faa'iido ah. Intaas waxaa kale oo ay suuqa u jawaabayo si dhaqso ah looma sameynayo khamiirka waqtiga ah. Bulshada xaduudahaas, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa hierarkiisa warqada ah, waxaynu baranaynaa qaab aad u leedahay, taasoo isticmaalaya taariikhda qoraalka si uu u sameeyo wax ka sii sheego waqtiga aad u taqaano in lagu helo faa'iido la rajaynayo. Dhaqdhaqaalkayagu wuxuu soo bandhigaa hababka farshaxanka oo ay ka badan tahay 8% oo ku qoran faa'iidada dhaqaalaha iyo khatar-si-hagaajinta ayaa dib u soo celinaya sawirada ganacsiga oo ku qoran laba bangiyo: Ingiriis iyo warqado dhaqaale ah oo Shiino ku qoran laba canshuur oo waaweyn iyo afar suuqa caalamiga ah. Baaritaanka waxqabadka iyo baaritaanka, waxaynu u dhisnaa qaababka aan u sameynno qalabka ganacsiga maalin walba.", 'si': 'ප්\u200dරයෝජනවත් ව්\u200dයාපාර ප්\u200dරදේශය සංස්කරණය සංස්කරණය විශ්වාස කරනවා ස්ටෝක් ව්\u200dයාපාර සංස විවිධ තොරතුරු සහ සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමය වගේ විවිධ තොරතුරු වලින් විවිධ තොරතුරු සාමාජික විශා ප්\u200dරධාන වැඩේ ස්ටොක් ස්ථානය ගැනීමක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හෝ විශේෂණ වැඩක් විදිහට බලාපොරොත්තු කරනවා ඒ වගේම ප ඊට පස්සේ, ඔවුන් මාර්කේට් ඉක්මනින් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක කරන්න පුළුවන් විශාල විශාල විශාල විශ අපි මේ සීමාවන් විශ්වාස කරනවා, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් පාළුවන් දත්ත ප්\u200dරයෝජනය අපේ අභියෝගයක් විශේෂ විදියට 8% විතරයි, සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ අවධානය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණ විදියට ආයෝජනය කරන්න බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දෙකක් ව සක්\u200dරිය සහ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්ලේෂණ වලින්, අපි අපේ විදියට හැමදාම ස්ටෝක් ව්\u200dයාපාරයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝ', 'sv': 'Att utforma lönsamma handelsstrategier är komplext eftersom aktierörelser är mycket stokastiska; Marknaden påverkas av stora volymer bullriga data från olika informationskällor som nyheter och sociala medier. Tidigare arbete behandlar mestadels aktierörelseförutsägelse som en regressions- eller klassificeringsuppgift och är inte direkt optimerad mot vinstskapande. Vidare modellerar de inte de tidsmässiga oegentligheterna i finkorniga mängder text som marknaden reagerar på snabbt. Baserat på dessa begränsningar föreslår vi en ny hierarkisk metod som lär sig rangordna med hjälp av textdata för att göra tidsmedvetna förutsägelser för rankning av aktier baserat på förväntad vinst. Vårt tillvägagångssätt överträffar toppmoderna metoder med över 8% när det gäller kumulativ vinst och riskjusterad avkastning i handelssimuleringar på två riktmärken: engelska tweets och kinesiska finansiella nyheter som spänner över två stora aktieindex och fyra globala marknader. Genom ablativa och kvalitativa analyser bygger vi upp argumentet för vår metod som ett verktyg för daglig aktiehandel.', 'ta': 'பயனுள்ள வியாபாரத்தின் திட்டங்களை வடிவமைப்பது சிக்கலாகும் நிலையில் காட்டு நகர்த்தல் மிகவும் பெரிய நி சந்தையில் செய்தி மற்றும் சமூக ஊடகங்களைப் போன்ற பல்வேறு தகவல் மூலங்களில் பெரிய சப்தமான தகவல்களை பாதிக்கும். முன்னிருப்பு வேலை பெரும்பாலாகவே பங்கு நகர்வு முன்னோட்டத்தை நிருப்பங்கள் அல்லது வகைப்படுத்தல் செயலாக்குகிறது மற் மேலும், அவர்கள் சந்தை விரைவில் பதில் கூறும் பெரிய உரையின் தொகுதியை விட்டு வெளியேற்றும் போது சரியான கால அளவு மாதிரியாத இந்த எல்லைகளை கட்டுவதில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய பரப்பு மின்னஞ்சல் திருத்தம் செய்கிறோம், நிலை முறைமையை கற்றுக்கொள்ளும், அது பயன்படுத்தும் நில நம்முடைய அணுகல் முறையில் 8% க்கு மேற்பட்ட முறைமைகளை செயல்படுத்துகிறது கட்டுப்பாட்டு பயன்பாடு மற்றும் ஆபத்து சரிபார்க்கப்பட்ட வியாபாரத்தில் இரு பகுதிகளின் பாவனை முழுமையான மற்றும் குறிப்பிட்ட ஆராய்ச்சிகள் மூலம், நாங்கள் எங்கள் முறையில் நாங்கள் நாள் பங்கு வணிக கருவி', 'ur': 'مفید ترکینگ استراتژی طراحی کرنا پیچیدہ ہے کیونکہ سٹاک حرکت بہت اچھی ہے۔ بازارت کو اخبار اور سوسیل میڈیا کی طرح مختلف معلومات کے سرمالوں میں بہت سی آواز ڈیٹا کے ذریعہ اثر دیتی ہے۔ اگلے کام سے اکثر سٹاک حرکت کی پیش بینی کو ریگرس یا کلاسیفون کا کام بنا رہا ہے اور وہ مستقیماً فائدہ سازی کی طرف اچھی نہیں کرتا۔ اور اس کے بعد ان لوگوں نے بہت سی غیرقابل غیرقابل تولید نہیں کی جسے بازارت سریع جواب دیتی ہے۔ یہ محدودیت پر بناتے ہیں، ہم ایک نئی آئرآرکیٹ کی پیشنهاد دیتے ہیں، ایک طریقے کی طریقے کی تعلیم دیتے ہیں جو متن ڈیٹ کو استعمال کرتا ہے تاریخ معلوم ہونے کے لئے انتظار کی نفع پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں. ہمارا طریقہ دو بنچم مارک کے ترکیم سیمولیزوں میں 8% سے زیادہ زیادہ استعمال کرتا ہے: انگلیسی ٹیوٹ اور چینی مالی خبر دو مالی سٹاکس انڈیکس اور چار گلوبل بازارٹ کے مطابق. قابل اور قابل تحقیقات کے ذریعہ، ہم نے اپنے طریقے کے لئے ایک وسیلہ بنایا ہے روزہ سٹاک تجارت کے لئے.', 'uz': "Qo'llar harakatlari juda qiziqarli holatdir. ko'p ko'pchilik har xil maʼlumot manbaslariga ko'pchilik qismi maʼlumotiga ishlaydi, yangi xabar va jamiyat media kabi. Birinchi ishni ko'pchilikdan boshqa aks harakat harakatlarini qayta boshqarish yoki classifash vazifasi sifatida ko'rsatadi va faqat ishlaganish uchun direktoriya moslama emas. Koʻrsatganda, suqqa tez javob beradigan matnning katta disk qismini chiqarishga qo'llamaydi. Ushbu chegaralarni yaratish uchun novel hierarchikni tahrirlash imkoniyatlarida o'rganamiz. Matn maʼlumotdan foydalanuvchi sonlarning vaqt bilan yaxshi taʼminlovchilarni ishlatish mumkin. Bizning murakkablarimiz, muloqat foydalanuvchi va xavfli o'zgartiriladigan odamlarni 8% dan ortiq ishlab chiqaradi. ikkita bog'lamalarda o'zgartiradi. Ingliz Twitterlar va Xitoycha, ikkita asosiy qismi indekslari va to'rt dunyo yo sohalari bilan keladi. Mualliflik va kvalifik analytiklar orqali, biz har kuni aks sonlarining asboblari deb o'ylaymiz.", 'vi': 'Định hướng chiến lược thương mại có lợi nhuận rất phức tạp vì chuyển động cổ phiếu cực kỳ ngẫu nhiên. Thị trường bị ảnh hưởng bởi lượng lớn dữ liệu ồn ào qua nhiều nguồn tin khác nhau như tin tức và truyền thông xã hội. Những công việc trước đây thường coi dự đoán chuyển động cổ phiếu như một nhiệm vụ hồi quy hay phân loại và không được trực tiếp tiên đoán về lợi nhuận. Hơn nữa, họ không mô tả những sai lầm thời gian nhỏ trong việc phát hành một lượng văn bản khổng lồ mà thị trường phải trả lời nhanh chóng. Dựa trên những giới hạn này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp cấp bậc mới, học cách xếp hạng, sử dụng các dữ liệu cấu trúc để dự đoán thời gian cho việc xếp hạng cổ phiếu dựa trên lợi nhuận dự kiến. Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi thực hiện các phương pháp hiện đại hơn 8+ theo mức lãi suất tích lũy tích lũy và độ thích hợp rủi ro trong các mô phỏng thương mại dựa trên hai điểm tiêu chuẩn: tweet tiếng Anh và tin tức tài chính Trung Quốc bao gồm hai hệ thống cổ phiếu lớn và bốn thị trường toàn cầu. Qua các phân tích có năng lực và chất lượng, chúng ta xây dựng phương pháp này như một công cụ để giao dịch hàng ngày.', 'bg': 'Проектирането на печеливши търговски стратегии е сложно, тъй като движенията на акциите са силно стохастични; пазарът е повлиян от големи обеми шумни данни в различни източници на информация като новини и социални медии. Предишната работа разглежда предимно прогнозирането на движението на акциите като регресионна или класификационна задача и не е директно оптимизирана за постигане на печалба. Освен това те не моделират фините времеви нередности при издаването на огромни обеми текст, на които пазарът реагира бързо. Въз основа на тези ограничения предлагаме нов йерархичен подход, който използва текстови данни, за да направи предсказания за класиране на акциите въз основа на очакваната печалба. Нашият подход превъзхожда най-съвременните методи с над 8% по отношение на кумулативната печалба и рисково коригираната възвръщаемост при търговски симулации на два бенчмарка: английски туитове и китайски финансови новини, обхващащи два основни борсови индекса и четири световни пазари. Чрез аблативни и качествени анализи изграждаме основание за нашия метод като инструмент за ежедневна търговия с акции.', 'da': 'At designe rentable handelsstrategier er kompleks, da aktiebevægelser er meget stokastiske; markedet påvirkes af store mængder støjende data på tværs af forskellige informationskilder som nyheder og sociale medier. Tidligere arbejde behandler for det meste aktiebevægelsesforudsigelse som en regressions- eller klassifikationsopgave og er ikke direkte optimeret til profit. Desuden modellerer de ikke de finkornede tidsmæssige uregelmæssigheder i frigivelsen af store mængder tekst, som markedet reagerer på hurtigt. Med udgangspunkt i disse begrænsninger foreslår vi en ny hierarkisk tilgang, der lærer at rangere, der bruger tekstdata til at lave tidsbevidste forudsigelser for rangering af aktier baseret på forventet profit. Vores tilgang overgår state-of-the-art metoder med over 8% i form af kumulativ fortjeneste og risikojusteret afkast i handelssimuleringer på to benchmarks: engelske tweets og kinesiske finansielle nyheder, der spænder over to store aktieindekser og fire globale markeder. Gennem ablative og kvalitative analyser opbygger vi sagen for vores metode som værktøj til daglig aktiehandel.', 'id': 'Merancang strategi perdagangan yang menguntungkan adalah kompleks karena gerakan saham sangat stokastik; the market is influenced by large volumes of noisy data across diverse information sources like news and social media.  Pekerjaan sebelumnya kebanyakan memperlakukan prediksi gerakan saham sebagai tugas regresi atau klasifikasi dan tidak secara langsung optimisasi untuk membuat keuntungan. Selain itu, mereka tidak memmodelir ketidakregularitas temporal gandum dalam pembebasan volum besar teks yang pasar merespon dengan cepat. Berdasarkan batasan-batasan ini, kami mengusulkan sebuah hierarkis baru, belajar untuk mengatur pendekatan yang menggunakan data tekstual untuk membuat prediksi yang sadar waktu untuk mengatur saham berdasarkan keuntungan yang diharapkan. pendekatan kita melebihi metode state-of-the-art dengan lebih dari 8% dalam terma keuntungan kumulatif dan keuntungan disesuaikan risiko dalam simulasi perdagangan pada dua tanda referensi: tweet Inggris dan berita keuangan Cina meliputi dua indeks saham besar dan empat pasar global. Melalui analisis ablatif dan kualitatif, kami membangun kasus untuk metode kami sebagai alat untuk perdagangan saham sehari-hari.', 'nl': 'Het ontwerpen van winstgevende handelsstrategieën is complex omdat aandelenbewegingen zeer stochastisch zijn; De markt wordt beïnvloed door grote hoeveelheden lawaaierige gegevens uit diverse informatiebronnen zoals nieuws en sociale media. Voorafgaand werk behandelt de voorspelling van aandelenbewegingen meestal als een regressie- of classificatietaak en is niet direct geoptimaliseerd voor winstgevendheid. Bovendien modelleren ze niet de fijnkorrelige tijdsonregelmatigheden bij het vrijgeven van enorme hoeveelheden tekst waarop de markt snel reageert. Voortbouwend op deze beperkingen stellen we een nieuwe hiërarchische, leren rangschikking voor die tekstuele gegevens gebruikt om tijdbewuste voorspellingen te maken voor het rangschikken van aandelen op basis van verwachte winst. Onze aanpak overtreft state-of-the-art methoden met meer dan 8% in termen van cumulatieve winst en risicogecorrigeerd rendement in handelssimulaties op twee benchmarks: Engelse tweets en Chinees financieel nieuws over twee belangrijke aandelenindexen en vier wereldwijde markten. Door middel van ablatieve en kwalitatieve analyses bouwen we de case op voor onze methode als instrument voor de dagelijkse aandelenhandel.', 'de': 'Die Entwicklung profitabler Handelsstrategien ist komplex, da Aktienbewegungen sehr stochastisch sind; Der Markt wird durch große Mengen an lauten Daten über verschiedene Informationsquellen wie Nachrichten und soziale Medien beeinflusst. Frühere Arbeiten behandeln die Vorhersage von Aktienbewegungen meist als Regressions- oder Klassifizierungsaufgabe und sind nicht direkt auf Gewinnerzielung optimiert. Darüber hinaus modellieren sie nicht die feinkörnigen zeitlichen Unregelmäßigkeiten bei der Veröffentlichung großer Textmengen, auf die der Markt schnell reagiert. Aufbauend auf diesen Einschränkungen schlagen wir einen neuartigen hierarchischen Ansatz vor, der anhand von Textdaten zeitbewusste Vorhersagen für das Ranking von Aktien basierend auf erwartetem Gewinn erstellt. Unser Ansatz übertrifft modernste Methoden um über 8% in Bezug auf kumulativen Gewinn und risikobereinigte Renditen in Handelssimulationen auf zwei Benchmarks: Englische Tweets und chinesische Finanznachrichten, die zwei große Aktienindizes und vier globale Märkte umfassen. Durch ablative und qualitative Analysen bauen wir auf unsere Methode als Werkzeug für den täglichen Aktienhandel.', 'hr': 'Dizajniranje profitabilnih trgovinskih strategija je kompleksno jer su kretanje dionica vrlo stokastična; tržište utječe na veliki volumi bučnih podataka u raznim izvorima informacija poput vijesti i društvenih medija. Prije posla uglavnom tretira predviđanje pokreta dionica kao zadatak regresije ili klasifikacije i nije direktno optimiziran prema zaradi profit a. Nadalje, oni ne modeluju privremene nepravilnosti finog zrnca u oslobađanju ogromnih voluma teksta na koje tržište brzo reagira. Na temelju tih ograničenja, predlažemo novu hijerarhičku, učenje za rankiranje pristupa koji koristi tekstualne podatke kako bi napravili predviđanja svjesnog vremena za rankiranje stokova na temelju očekivanih profit a. Naš pristup nadmašuje metode države umjetnosti preko 8% u smislu kumulativnog profita i prilagođenih povratka rizika u simulaciji trgovine na dvije kriterije: engleske tweets i kineske financijske vijesti koje šire dvije velike indekse dionica i četiri globalne tržišta. Kroz aktivne i kvalitativne analize, izgradili smo slučaj za našu metodu kao alat za dnevnu trgovinu dionicama.', 'sw': 'Utengenezaji mkakati wa biashara yenye faida ni tatizo kwa sababu harakati za mifugo ni za kusisimua sana; soko hilo linaathiriwa na idadi kubwa ya taarifa za kelele katika vyanzo mbalimbali vya habari kama vile habari na mitandao ya kijamii. Kazi ya awali huwa hutumia utabiri wa harakati za kibiashara kama juhudi la kudhibitiwa au kutangaza na haiwezekani moja kwa moja kwenye kutengeneza faida. Zaidi ya hayo, hawaonyeshi ukosefu wa muda wa muda wa maiti katika kuachiwa kwa kiasi kikubwa cha maandishi ambacho soko hilo linajibu kwa haraka. Kujenga vizuizi hivi, tunapendekeza utaratibu wa riwaya, kujifunza kuelekeza vyeo vya rangi ambavyo hutumia taarifa za msingi ili kufanya utabiri wa muda unaotarajiwa kwa ajili ya soko linalotegemea faida. Hatua yetu inafanya mbinu za sanaa kwa zaidi ya asilimia 8 kwa kiasi cha faida na hatari zilizobadilishwa zinarejea katika simulizi za biashara mbili za bendera: Twiti za Kiingereza na habari za kiuchumi za China zinazopandisha vifaa viwili vikuu vya ushindi na masoko nne duniani. Kwa kupitia uchambuzi wenye ufanisi na uhakika, tunajenga kesi kwa njia yetu kama zana kwa ajili ya biashara ya kibiashara kila siku.', 'ko': '유리한 거래 전략을 설계하는 것은 복잡하다. 왜냐하면 주식 운동은 고도로 무작위이기 때문이다.시장은 뉴스와 소셜미디어 등 다양한 정보원에서 나온 대량의 시끄러운 데이터의 영향을 받았다.이전의 업무 대부분은 주식 동향 예측을 회귀 또는 분류 임무로 간주했고 이윤에 대해 직접적으로 최적화를 하지 않았다.그 밖에 그들은 시장이 신속하게 호응하는 대량의 텍스트 발표 중의 미세한 시간 위반 행위를 모델링하지 않았다.이러한 한계성을 바탕으로 우리는 새로운 층별 학습 순위 방법을 제시했다. 이 방법은 텍스트 데이터를 이용하여 예상 이윤을 바탕으로 하는 주식 순위에 대해 시간 감지 예측을 한다.두 가지 기준을 바탕으로 하는 거래 시뮬레이션에서 우리의 방법은 누적 이윤과 리스크 조정 수익률에 있어 가장 선진적인 방법인 8% 이상보다 우수하다. 영문 트위터와 중국 재정 뉴스는 두 개의 주가지수와 네 개의 글로벌 시장을 포함한다.정성과 정성 분석을 통해 우리는 우리의 방법을 위해 사례를 구축하여 일상적인 주식 거래의 도구로 삼았다.', 'fa': 'طراحی استراتژی های تجارت سودمند پیچیده است چون حرکت های سهام بسیار استراتژی هستند. بازار توسط مجموعه های زیادی از داده های صوتی در منابع اطلاعات مختلف مثل اخبار و رسانه های اجتماعی تأثیر می\u200cدهد. کارهای پیشینیان بیشتر پیش بینی حرکت سهام را به عنوان یک کار بازگشتی یا گروه\u200cبندی درمان می\u200cکند و مستقیماً به طریق ساختن سود بهترین نمی\u200cشود. بعلاوه، آنها غیرقانونی موقتی دانه\u200cهای پاکیزه را در آزاد کردن مجموعه\u200cهای متن زیادی که بازار به سریع پاسخ می\u200cدهد مدل نمی\u200cکنند. بر روی این محدودیت، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک دایره\u200cآفرینی نو، یاد گرفتن از طریق دسترسی که از داده\u200cهای متن استفاده می\u200cکند تا پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای آگاهی زمان برای رقابت ذخیره\u200cها بر اساس سود انتظار داشته باشد. روش ما روش\u200cهای وضعیت هنری بیش از ۸ درصد به عنوان سود جمع و تغییر ریسک در شبیه\u200cهای تجارت در دو برچسب بیشتر از ۸ درصد انجام می\u200cدهد: تویت انگلیسی و خبرهای مالی چینی که دو نقشه\u200cهای بزرگ سرمایه\u200cگذاری و چهار بازار جهانی می\u200cباشند. از طریق تحلیل\u200cهای قابل و کیفیت، پرونده را برای روش خودمان به عنوان ابزار تجارت صندوق روزانه ساختیم.', 'tr': 'Ýabşyrylykly ticaret stratejilerini tasarlamak stock hereketleri örän ýokary bir şekilde döredir; bazar täzelikler we sosial mediýalar ýaly görnüş gürrüňli hatlaryň birnäçe-görnüş habarlary tarapyndan täsir edýär. Öňki işiň köplenç sanlaryň hareket etmegini regressiýa ýa-da klasifikasyýa täblisasy hökmünde gözleýän bolup durýar we kän gazanç etmegine gözleýän däldir. Mundan soňra, bazaryň tiz jogap beren täzeliklerden üýtgetmeginde gaty täzeliklerde süýtgetmezlikler däldir. Bu çöplüklere meýilleşdirýän bolsa, biz bir roman iýerarhiýaly, tekstual maglumatlary ulanan zamany gözlenen gazanç üçin sagatlar üçin öngörümlerini saýlamak üçin tekrarhiýa öwrenip tekrarhiýarys. Biziň ýaryşymyz kumulatiw peýdalyk we riskli ýerleşmeler üçin 2 benchmarklarda daşaryş simulasyonunda: Iňlisler tweets we Hytaý maliýe täzelikler 2 sany indiks we dört dünýädäki bazarlar bilen uzaklaşýar. Jawanyş we kwalitet analyzlaryň ýüzerinde, günlük stok ticareti üçin davamyz üçin guruldyk.', 'af': "Ontwerping van rentbaar handeling strategies is kompleks as stoeke bewegings is baie stokasteek; die markte word deur groot volume geluide data oor verskeie inligting bronne soos nuus en sosiale media influens. Vorige werk behandel meeste stoeke beweging voorskou as 'n regresie of klassifikasie taak en is nie direk optimaliseer na profitmaak nie. Verder, hulle model nie die fyn-koring tydelike ongeregtighede in die verlossing van groot volume van teks wat die markeet vinnig reageer nie. By gebou op hierdie beperkinge, voorstel ons 'n nuwe hierarkies, leer om toegang te rank wat tekstuele data gebruik om tydverkende voorskou te maak vir ranking stoeke gebaseer op verwagte profit. Ons toegang uitvoer state-of-the-art metodes deur meer 8% in terms van kumulatiewe profit en risiko-aangepas terugkeer in verkoop simulasies op twee benchmarke: Engelske tweets en Sjinese finansiële nuus wat twee groot stoeke indekse en vier globaale marke uitspreek. Deur ablatiewe en kvalitatiewe analiserings bou ons die geval vir ons metode as 'n nutsbalk vir daglike stoeke handeling.", 'sq': 'Projektimi i strategjive tregtare të fitueshme është kompleks pasi lëvizjet e aksioneve janë shumë stokastike; tregu ndikohet nga volume të mëdha të dhënash zhurmuese nëpërmjet burimeve të ndryshme të informacionit si lajmet dhe media sociale. Puna e mëparshme trajton kryesisht parashikimin e lëvizjes së aksioneve si një detyrë regresive apo klasifikimi dhe nuk optimizohet drejtpërdrejt drejt fitimit. Për më tepër, ata nuk modelojnë parregullsitë temporale të drithërave të holla në lëshimin e volumeve të mëdha të tekstit që tregu i përgjigjet shpejt. Duke u ndërtuar në këto kufizime, ne propozojmë një hierarkik të ri, mësim për të renditur qasjen që përdor të dhënat tekstuale për të bërë parashikime të ndërgjegjshme për renditjen e aksioneve bazuar në fitimin e pritur. Përqasja jonë tejkalon metodat më të larta me më shumë se 8% lidhur me fitimin kumulativ dhe kthimet e rregulluara nga rreziku në simulimet e tregtisë në dy pika: tweetet angleze dhe lajmet financiare kineze që përfshijnë dy indekset e mëdha të aksioneve dhe katër tregje globale. Nëpërmjet analizave ablative dhe kualitative, ne ndërtojmë rastin për metodën tonë si një mjet për tregtinë e përditshme të aksioneve.', 'am': 'የሚጠቅመው የንግድ ዘዴ መግለጫ ጥቅመት ትክክለኛ ነው፡፡ ገበሬቱ እንደ ዜና እና ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ በተለያዩ የድምፅ ድምፅ ድምፅ በተለየ የድምፅ ድምፅ ላይ ነው፡፡ አስቀድሞ ሥራ አብዛኛውን የድርጊት መንቀሳቀስ ለመቀበል ወይም ለመለያየት የሚደረግ ስራ እና ለጥቅም ማቀናቀል በቀጥታ አይሻልም፡፡ ደግሞም ገበያ ፈጥኖ በሚመልሱበት የጽሑፍ ብዛት የጥሩ እህል ሰዓት ክፍተቶችን አያሳልፉም፡፡ እነዚህን ግንኙነት በመሠረት ላይ፣ የሮሜን አዳራርክሲ፣ የሥርዓት ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም በተስፋው ጥቅም ለመጠየቅ የሚታወቅ የጊዜውን ትንቢት ለማድረግ ለመጠቀም እናስጀምራለን፡፡ የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-አርእስት ሀብትን ከ8 በመቶ የሚጨምር ጥቅም እና የደህና ጉዳይ ማሰናከል በሁለት የዋጋ ማህበረሰብ ላይ መልሶ እንዲመለስ ነው፤ እንግሊዘኛ ትዊተሮች እና የቻይና የሀብት ዜና ሁለት ትልቁ የድርሻ ጥቅሎች እና አራት ዓለምአቀፍ ገበያዎች የሚዘጋጁት ነው፡፡ በችሎታዊ እና በተመሳሳይ፣ የዕለት ዕለት የጋሻ ንግድ መሣሪያ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Ուղղակի առևտրային ռազմավարությունների ձևավորումը բարդ է, քանի որ արժեքների շարժումները բարձր վիճակում են: շուկային ազդում են ձայնային տվյալների մեծ ծավալը տարբեր տեղեկատվական աղբյուրներում, ինչպիսիք են նորությունները և սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցները: Նախորդ աշխատանքը հիմնականում վերաբերում է արժեքների շարժման կանխատեսումներին որպես ռեգրեսիայի կամ դասակարգման խնդիր և անմիջապես օպտիմացված չէ շահույթի համար: Ավելին, նրանք չեն մոդելավորում գեղեցիկ ցորենի ժամանակակից անօրինակությունները տեքստի հսկայական ծավալների հրապարակում, որոնց վրա շուկայը արագ արձագանքում է: Հիմնվելով այս սահմանափակումների վրա, մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր հիերարխիկ, սովորելով դասավորել մոտեցումը, որը օգտագործում է տեքստային տվյալներ, որպեսզի ժամանակով գիտակցած կանխատեսումներ կատարի պաշարների դասավորման համար, հիմնված ակ Our approach outperforms state-of-the-art methods by over 8% in terms of cumulative profit and risk-adjusted returns in trading simulations on two benchmarks: English tweets and Chinese financial news spanning two major stock indexes and four global markets.  Աբլատիվ և որակային վերլուծությունների միջոցով մենք կառուցում ենք մեր մեթոդը որպես ամենօրյա արժեքի առևտրի գործիք:', 'az': 'Faylı ticarət stratejilərini tasarlamaq, stok hərəkətləri çox stochastik olduğu üçün kompleks olur. bazar xəbərlər və sosyal media kimi müxtəlif məlumatlar arasında böyük səs verilən məlumatlar təsirləndirilir. Əvvəlki işin çox hissəsi hərəkət tədbirlərini regresiya ya da klasifikasiya görevi kimi təhsil edir və dərəcə mənfəət qazanmağa optimizlənmir. Daha sonra, bazarının tezliklə cavab verən böyük mətn volumlarını yayındırmaq üçün sünbül dənələrin müəyyən edilməsini modelləşdirmirlər. Bu limitlərə baxmayaraq, biz yeni hiyerarşik təklif edirik, təklif olunan məlumatları istifadə edir ki, gözlənilmiş faydası üzərində dərəcə-dərəcə hazırlanmaq üçün vaxt xəbərsiz təklif edərlər. Bizim tərzimimiz 2 benchmarki ticarət simülasyonu ilə kumulativ fayda və risk-adjusted geri dönüşünü 8%-dən art ırar: İngiliz tweets və Çin mali xəbərləri iki böyük stock indekslərini və dörd küresel bazarlarını genişləyirlər. Qabiliyyətli və qabiliyyətli analizlər vasitəsilə, bu metodu günlük stock ticarəti üçün vasitəsi olaraq inşa edirik.', 'ca': "El disseny d'estratègies comercials rentables és complexa perquè els moviments d'accions són molt estòcastics; the market is influenced by large volumes of noisy data across diverse information sources like news and social media.  La feina anterior tracta principalment la predicció del moviment d'accions com una tasca de regressió o classificació i no està optimitzada directament cap a la producció de beneficis. També no modelen les irregularitats temporals de grans fins en la publicació de grans quantitats de text que el mercat respon ràpidament. A partir d'aquestes limitacions, proposem una nova jeràrquica, aprenent a classificar l'enfocament que utilitza dades textuals per fer prediccions conscients del temps per classificar les accions basades en el benefici esperat. El nostre enfocament supera els mètodes més avançats en més d'un 8% en termes de lucre acumulat i rendiment ajustat al risc en simulacions comercials en dos punts de referència: tweets anglesos i notícies financeres xineses que abasteixen dos índexs principals de acció i quatre mercats mundials. A través d'anàlisis ablatives i qualitatives, construïm el cas del nostre mètode com una eina per al comerç quotidià de borses.", 'cs': 'Navrhování ziskových obchodních strategií je složité, protože pohyby akcií jsou vysoce stochastické; trh je ovlivněn velkým objemem hlučných dat napříč různými informačními zdroji, jako jsou zprávy a sociální média. Předchozí práce se většinou zachází s predikcí pohybu akcií jako s regresním nebo klasifikačním úkolem a není přímo optimalizována směrem k zisku. Dále nemodelují jemnozrnné časové nesrovnalosti při uvolňování obrovských objemů textu, na které trh rychle reaguje. Na základě těchto omezení navrhujeme nový hierarchický, učící se hodnocení přístup, který využívá textová data k vytvoření časově orientovaných predikcí pro hodnocení akcií založených na očekávaném zisku. Náš přístup překonává nejmodernější metody o více než 8% z hlediska kumulativního zisku a rizikově upravených výnosů v obchodních simulacích na dvou benchmarkech: anglických tweetech a čínských finančních zpráv zahrnujících dva hlavní akciové indexy a čtyři globální trhy. Prostřednictvím ablativních a kvalitativních analýz budujeme případ pro naši metodu jako nástroj pro každodenní obchodování s akciemi.', 'bs': 'Dizajniranje profitabilnih trgovinskih strategija je kompleksno jer su kretanja dionica vrlo stokastična; tržište utiče veliki volumi buknih podataka u raznim izvorima informacija poput vijesti i društvenih medija. Prije posla uglavnom tretira predviđanje pokreta dionica kao regresiju ili klasifikaciju i nije direktno optimiziran prema zaradi profit a. Dalje, oni ne modeluju privremene nepravilnosti finog zrnca u oslobađanju ogromnih voluma teksta na koje tržište brzo reagira. Na temelju tih ograničenja, predlažemo novu hijerarhičku, učenje za rankiranje pristupa koji koristi tekstualne podatke kako bi napravili predviđanja svjesnog vremena za rankiranje stokova na temelju očekivanih profit a. Naš pristup iznosi metode države umjetnosti preko 8% u smislu kumulativnog profita i prilagođenih povratka rizika u simulacijama trgovine na dvije kriterije: engleske tweets i kineske financijske vijesti koje šire dvije velike indekse dionica i četiri globalne tržišta. Kroz aktivne i kvalitativne analize, izgradili smo slučaj za našu metodu kao alat za dnevnu trgovinu dionicama.', 'bn': 'লাভজনক বাণিজ্যিক কৌশলগুলো ডিজাইন করা জটিল, কারণ স্ট্যাক আন্দোলন অত্যন্ত স্ট্যাক আন্দোলন অত্যন্ত জটিল; সংবাদ এবং সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের মত বিভিন্ন তথ্যের সূত্রের বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন তথ্যের বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ Prior work mostly treats stock movement prediction as a regression or classification task and is not directly optimized towards profit-making.  এছাড়াও তারা বাজারের দ্রুত প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রদান করে বিশাল লেখার মুক্তি প্রদানের মধ্যে সুন্দর শস্যের সাময়িক বৈধতা মডেল এই সীমাবদ্ধতা নির্মাণ করার জন্য আমরা একটি নোভেল হিয়েরার্কিলিক্যাল প্রস্তাব করছি, যেটি প্রত্যাশা করা লাভের ভিত্তিতে টেক্সুয়াল ডাটা ব্ আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা কুমুলিটিভ লাভ এবং ঝুঁকির সংশোধনের মাধ্যমে ৮% বেশী শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রীয় পদ্ধতি প্রকাশ করে দুই বেনমার্কের উপর ব্যবসা সিমালেশনে ফিরে আসে: ইংরেজী  সক্রিয় এবং পরিমাণ বিশ্লেষণের মাধ্যমে আমরা প্রতিদিনের ট্যাক্স ব্যবসার জন্য এই মামলা তৈরি করি।', 'et': 'Kasumlike kauplemisstrateegiate kujundamine on keeruline, kuna aktsiate liikumine on väga stohhastiline; turgu mõjutab suur hulk mürakaid andmeid erinevatest teabeallikatest, näiteks uudistest ja sotsiaalmeediast. Varasemates töödes käsitletakse varude liikumise prognoosimist enamasti regressiooni- või klassifitseerimisülesandena ning seda ei optimeerita otseselt kasumi saamiseks. Lisaks sellele ei modelleeri need suurte tekstikoguste avaldamisel peenete teraliste ajaliste ebakorrapärasuste kohta, millele turg reageerib kiiresti. Nende piirangute põhjal pakume välja uudse hierarhilise, õppiva järjestamise lähenemisviisi, mis kasutab tekstiandmeid ajateadlike prognooside tegemiseks aktsiate järjestamiseks, mis põhinevad oodataval kasumil. Meie lähenemisviis ületab tipptasemel meetodeid kumulatiivse kasumi ja riskiga korrigeeritud tulu poolest üle 8% kauplemissimulatsioonides kahel võrdlusalusel: inglise säutsud ja Hiina finantsauudised, mis hõlmavad kaht peamist aktsiaindeksit ja nelja ülemaailmset turgu. Ablatiivsete ja kvalitatiivsete analüüside kaudu loome oma meetodi kui vahendi igapäevaseks aktsiatehinguks.', 'fi': 'Kannattavien kaupankﾃ､yntistrategioiden suunnittelu on monimutkaista, koska osakkeiden liikkeet ovat erittﾃ､in stokastisia; Markkinoihin vaikuttavat suuret mﾃ､ﾃ､rﾃ､t meluisaa dataa eri tietolﾃ､hteistﾃ､, kuten uutisista ja sosiaalisesta mediasta. Aiempi tyﾃｶ kﾃ､sittelee osakeliikkeen ennustamista lﾃ､hinnﾃ､ regressio- tai luokittelutehtﾃ､vﾃ､nﾃ､ eikﾃ､ sitﾃ､ ole optimoitu suoraan voittoa tavoittelemaan. Lisﾃ､ksi niissﾃ､ ei mallinneta hienojyvﾃ､isiﾃ､ ajallisia epﾃ､sﾃ､ﾃ､nnﾃｶllisyyksiﾃ､ suurten tekstimﾃ､ﾃ､rien julkaisemisessa, joihin markkinat reagoivat nopeasti. Nﾃ､iden rajoitusten pohjalta ehdotamme uudenlaista hierarkkista, oppivaa rankkausta koskevaa lﾃ､hestymistapaa, joka kﾃ､yttﾃ､ﾃ､ tekstidataa tehdﾃ､kseen aikatietoisia ennusteita osakkeiden sijoitukselle odotetun voiton perusteella. Lﾃ､hestymistapamme on yli 8% nopeampi kumulatiivisen voiton ja riskikorjatun tuoton suhteen kaupankﾃ､yntisimulaatioissa kahdella vertailuarvolla: englanninkieliset tweetit ja kiinalaiset talousuutiset, jotka kattavat kaksi suurta osakeindeksiﾃ､ ja neljﾃ､ maailmanlaajuista markkina-aluetta. Ablatiivisten ja laadullisten analyysien avulla rakennamme perustan menetelmﾃ､llemme pﾃ､ivittﾃ､isen osakekaupan tyﾃｶkaluna.', 'ha': "Ana designi taki masu amfani da fatauci ya zama mai adadi kamar yadda motsi na dabbõbin su ne mai girma; the market is influenced by large volumes of noisy data across diverse information sources like news and social media.  Kayyar aikin da aka yi amfani da abu mafi yawa don an yi bayani ga shirin ayuka na ƙanshi ko kuma ba za a yi amfani da shi ba zuwa mai amfani da shi. Da haka, bã su sami tsarin nauyin ƙwãya cikin saka mai girma na matsayin da marketi ke karɓa da gaggawa. Buning kan wannan tsaro, muna buƙata wani hiera-littafan, ana karanta matsayi da za'a yi amfani da matsayin da data na rubutu dõmin ya yi bayani ga zaman-taƙaita wa matsayin da aka sanar da fasahan da aka ƙayyade amfani da. MataimakinMu na samar da halin-sanar da taki 8% a cikin muhimman amfani da risiko da aka juya ya koma cikin misalin salofa biyu: Ingiriya ta'yan littattafai da na'ura da ma'anar kashi biyu masu ƙaranci na rubuci. Ina iya amfani da fassarar da taƙaitacce, muna samar da kashi wa hanyoyinmu kamar zance wa cinikin misalin abubuwan a yinin.", 'sk': 'Oblikovanje dobičkonosnih strategij trgovanja je zapleteno, saj so premiki delnic zelo stohastični; na trg vplivajo velike količine hrupnih podatkov iz različnih virov informacij, kot so novice in družbeni mediji. Predhodno delo predvsem obravnava napoved gibanja delnic kot regresijsko ali klasifikacijsko nalogo in ni neposredno optimizirano za ustvarjanje dobička. Poleg tega ne modelirajo drobnozrnatih časovnih nepravilnosti pri objavi velikih količin besedila, na katere se trg hitro odziva. Na podlagi teh omejitev predlagamo nov hierarhični pristop, ki uporablja besedilne podatke za pripravo časovno zavedanih napovedi za razvrščanje delnic na podlagi pričakovanega dobička. Naš pristop presega najsodobnejše metode za več kot 8% v smislu kumulativnega dobička in tveganju prilagojenih donosov v simulacijah trgovanja na dveh referenčnih merilih: angleških tweetih in kitajskih finančnih novicah, ki zajemajo dva glavna borzna indeksa in štiri svetovne trge. Z ablativnimi in kvalitativnimi analizami gradimo primer za našo metodo kot orodje za vsakodnevno trgovanje z delnicami.', 'bo': 'རྒྱལ་སྐྱོར་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཐོག་འབྲེལ་གྱི་དམིགས་འབྱོར་ཇུས་འདི་ཅུང་མཛོད་སྤེལ་བཞིན་ཏེ། དྲ་རྒྱའི་ནང་དུ་གསར་འགྱུར་དང་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་བརྡ་སྟོན་ཆ་ཆེ་བ་ སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཅ་གཡོན་འགྱུར་གྱི་སྔོན་ལྟར་རྣམས་regression ཡང་ན་དབྱེ་སྡུད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་ལ་ཕན་ཚུན་དང་ཐད་ཀར་ར ད་ལས་ཀྱང་། ཁོང་ཚོས་དཔལ་འབྱོར་གྱི་ཆེ་ཆུང་དུ་འགྱུར་སྤྱོད་མེད་པའི་ཚིག་ཡིག Building on these limitations, we propose a novel hierarchical, learning to rank approach that uses textual data to make time-aware predictions for ranking stocks based on expected profit. ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་གྱིས་cumulative profit་དང་risk-adjusted བསྟར་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལས་བརྟན་དཔྱད་ཡོད། ནུས་ཡོད་བྱས་ཆོག་དང་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཐད་ནས་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་རྗེས་སུ་བཀོད་པ་ཡིན།', 'he': 'עיצוב אסטרטגיות סחר רווחיות מורכבת, כיוון שתנועות המניות הן סטוקסטיות מאוד; השוק משפיע על ידי כמויות גדולות של נתונים רעשים ברחבי מקורות מידע מגוונים כמו חדשות ומדיה חברתית. העבודה הקודמת מתייחסת בעיקר לחזות תנועת המניות כמשימה של מחזור או מסווג ולא אופטימית ישירות כלפי יצירת רווח. חוץ מזה, הם לא דוגמנים את אי-חוקי הזמנים של גרעינים דקים בשחרור של כמויות עצומות של טקסט שהשוק מגיב אליהם מהר. בניין על הגבלות האלה, אנו מציעים הייררכית חדשה, ללמוד לדרגה גישה שמשתמשת בנתונים טקסטיים הגישה שלנו עולה על שיטות חדשות במיוחד על פי יותר מ-8% במונחים של רווח קומפולטיבי והתוצאות מסוכנות בסימולציות סחר בשני נקודות: טוויטים אנגליים וחדשות פיננסיות סיניות שמחבילות שני אינדיקסי מניות גדולים וארבעה שוקים גלובליים. באמצעות ניתוחים אבלטיביים ואיכותיים, אנו בונים את התיק לשיטה שלנו ככלי לסחר במניות יומית.', 'jv': 'Tulung punika ingkang sampeyan akeh dumadhi winih kanggo kegampang gerakan ingkang diolah Laptop" and "Desktop politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Lah-alah, wong kuwi ora model sing dadi irugular-uwis layang kanggo ngilanggar volum sing luwih dumateng seneng sing nganggo barang ketahan. Iyo nggawe limiting iki, kita mudhaya nyugane perusahaan kelangan anyar, ingkang dipileh basa dadi textual nggawe nggawe tarjamahan kanggo dianggap kanggo dianggap tarjamahan kanggo dianggap tarjamahan kanggo dianggap tarjamahan Awakdhéwé nggawe barang-aké perusahaan kelas telah-karbot sing luwih sabên 8% sing diranggawe barang nggawe gerakan karo sistem sing gawe nyimpen negoro iki bench: Tuit karo dolang tanggal sing dirangkat dhuwur, dolang nggawe barang tanggal kuwi maburén dolang nggawe Atowah able karo kaliwatirne soko nggawe barang-alat iki dadi, kita mbukak cara nggawe barang nggawe barang alat kanggo tukang nggawe dolanan warisan'}
{'en': 'Building Representative Corpora from Illiterate Communities : A Reviewof Challenges and Mitigation Strategies for Developing Countries', 'es': 'Creación de corpus representativos a partir de comunidades analfabetas: una revisión de los desafíos y las estrategias de mitigación para los países en desarrollo', 'ar': 'بناء أعضاء ممثلين من المجتمعات الأمية: مراجعة للتحديات واستراتيجيات التخفيف للبلدان النامية', 'fr': "Création de corpus représentatifs issus de communautés analphabètes\xa0: examen des défis et des stratégies d'atténuation pour les pays en développement", 'pt': 'Construindo Corpora Representativos de Comunidades Analfabetas: Uma Revisão de Desafios e Estratégias de Mitigação para Países em Desenvolvimento', 'zh': '立文盲社区代表性语料库:审发展中国家临战杀略', 'ja': '非識字コミュニティからの代表コーポラの構築：開発途上国の課題と緩和戦略のレビュー', 'ru': 'Создание представительных корпораций из неграмотных сообществ: обзор вызовов и стратегий смягчения последствий для развивающихся стран', 'hi': 'निरक्षर समुदायों से प्रतिनिधि निगम का निर्माण: विकासशील देशों के लिए चुनौतियों और शमन रणनीतियों की समीक्षा', 'ga': 'Corpora Ionadaíoch a Thógáil ó Phobail Neamhliteartha: Athbhreithniú ar Dhúshláin agus ar Straitéisí Maolaithe do Thíortha i bhForbairt', 'ka': 'განვითარება ქვეყნებისთვის განსაზღვრება და განსაზღვრება სტრატიგიები', 'el': 'Οικοδόμηση Σώματος Αντιπροσώπων από Παράνομες Κοινότητες: Ανασκόπηση Προκλήσεων και Στρατηγικών Μέτρησης για τις Αναπτυσσόμενες Χώρες', 'hu': 'Corpora kiépítése az Illiterált Közösségekből: a fejlődő országok kihívásainak és enyhítési stratégiáinak áttekintése', 'it': 'Costruire un corpo rappresentativo delle comunità analfabetisme: una rassegna di due sfide e strategie di mitigazione per i paesi in via di sviluppo', 'kk': 'Құрамындағы көпшіліктердің негізгі корпорасын құру: Құрамындағы елдердің қайталау және бақылау стратегиясы', 'lt': 'Building Representative Corpora from Illiterate Communities: A Reviewof Challenges and Mitigation Strategies for Developing Countries', 'mk': 'Градежната претставничка корпора од нелитературните заедници: Преглед на предизвиците и стратегиите за олеснување на развојните земји', 'ml': 'വികസിക്കുന്ന രാജ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഒരു പ്രതിനിധിയുടെ കോര്\u200dപ്പോരാ നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Il-Bini tar-Rappreżentant Korpora mill-Komunitajiet Illetterati: Reviżjoni ta’ Sfidi u Strateġiji ta’ Mitigazzjoni għall-Pajjiżi li qed jiżviluppaw', 'mn': 'Зөвлөгч Корпора бий болгож буй Хүмүүс: Шинэ хөгжлийн улс орнуудын зориулалтын зориулалтын давтамжлалт болон багасгал хөгжлийн стратеги', 'ms': 'Bangunan Perwakilan Korpora dari Komuniti Illiterate: Review of Challenges and Mitigation Strategies for Developing Countries', 'no': 'Bygging av Representative Corpora frå Illiterate Communities: A Reviewof Challenges and Mitigation Strategies for Developing Countries', 'pl': 'Budowanie korpusu przedstawicieli nielegalnych społeczności: przegląd wyzwań i strategii łagodzenia krajów rozwijających się', 'ro': 'Construirea Reprezentantului Corpora al Comunităţilor Illiterate: o analiză a două provocări şi strategii de atenuare pentru ţările în curs de dezvoltare', 'sr': 'Izgradnja predstavnika Korpore iz neliteratnih zajednica: Reviewof Challenges i Mitigation Strategies for Developing Countries', 'si': 'නිර්මාණය සම්බන්ධයෙන් නිර්මාණය කර්පෝරාව නිර්මාණය කරන්න: A Reviewof challenges and Mitigation Stratex for Developer Countrs', 'so': 'Building Representative Corpora from Illiterate Communities: A Review of Challenges and Mitigation Strategies for Developing Countries', 'sv': 'Att bygga upp representant för Corpora från analfabeter: En översyn av utmaningar och strategier för att minska utvecklingsländerna', 'ur': 'ایلیٹریٹ کمونٹیوں سے Representative Corpora بنانا: A Reviewof Challenges and Mitigation Strategies for Developing Countries', 'ta': 'உருவாக்கும் நாடுகளிலிருந்து பிரதிநிதியான கோர்போரா உருவாக்குகிறது: ஒரு சவால்பங்கள் மற்றும் வளர்ந்து வரும் நாடுகளுக', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Giám đốc xây dựng, Corpus, đến từ các cộng đồng, Một cuộc thử thách và các chiến lược chi tiêu cho các quốc gia phát triển.', 'da': 'Opbygning af repræsentant for Corpora fra analfabetiske fællesskaber: En gennemgang af udfordringer og afbødningsstrategier for udviklingslandene', 'nl': 'Het opbouwen van een representatief korpora uit illegale gemeenschappen: een evaluatie van uitdagingen en mitigatiestrategieën voor ontwikkelingslanden', 'de': 'Aufbau von Repräsentantenkorpora aus illegalen Gemeinschaften: Ein Überblick über Herausforderungen und Minderungsstrategien für Entwicklungsländer', 'id': 'Membangun Perwakilan Korpora dari Komunitas Illiterate: Sebuah Review of Challenges and Mitigation Strategies for Developing Countries', 'bg': 'Изграждане на представителен корпор от незаконни общности: преглед на предизвикателствата и стратегиите за смекчаване на проблемите за развиващите се страни', 'hr': 'Izgradnja predstavnika korpore iz neliteratnih zajednica: Reviewof Challenges i Mitigation Strategies for Developing Countries', 'sw': 'Kujenga Representative Corpora kutoka Jumuiya ya Wasalama: Mapitio ya Mapinduzi na Mipango ya Mitigation kwa ajili ya nchi zinazoendelea', 'tr': 'Mazmunlyk jemgyýetleri tarapyndan çykarylyş hasaplanja: A Reviewof Challenges and Mitigation Strategies for Developing Countries', 'ko': '문맹 지역사회에서 대표적인 자료 라이브러리 구축: 개발도상국이 직면한 도전과 완화 전략에 대한 종합 서술', 'fa': 'ساختن نماینده کورپورا از جامعه های غیرقانونی: یک بازرسی از چالش\u200cها و استراتژی تغییرات برای کشورهای توسعه', 'am': 'የኢሌት ማኅበረሰቦች ተሟጋቾች የኮርፖር ተሟጋቾች: የውይይት ግንኙነት እና የመጠቀሚያ ስርዓት ለመሻለል ሀገሮች', 'hy': 'Արտահայտված համայնքների ներկայացուցիչ Կորպորան կառուցելը՝ զարգացող երկրների մարտահրավերների և նվազեցման ռազմավարությունների վերլուծում', 'az': 'ńįddia etm…ô c…ômiyy…ôtl…ôrind…ôn Representative Corpora inŇüaat: ńįnŇüallaŇüdńĪrma c…ômiyy…ôtl…ôrinin yenid…ôn √ß…ôtinlikl…ôri v…ô d√ľz…ôltm…ô Strateji', 'bs': 'Izgradnja predstavnika korpore iz neliteratnih zajednica: Reviewof Challenges i Mitigation Strategies for Developing Countries', 'af': 'Opbou Representative Corpora van Illiterate Communities: ֳ¢ֲ€ֲ™n Reviewof Challenges and Mitigation Strategies for Developing Countries', 'sq': 'Ndërtimi i Korporas Përfaqësuese nga Komunitetet e Paqarta: Një përmbledhje e sfidave dhe strategjive të lehtësimit për vendet në zhvillim', 'et': 'Ebaseaduslike kogukondade esinduskorpuse loomine: arengumaade väljakutsete ja leevendusstrateegiate ülevaade', 'bn': 'আইলিটেটার কমিউনিটি থেকে প্রতিনিধি কোর্পোরা নির্মাণ করছে: উন্নয়নশীল দেশগুলোর জন্য একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ এবং মিটারেশন কৌশল', 'fi': 'Laittomien yhteis√∂jen edustajakorporan rakentaminen: kehitysmaiden haasteiden ja lievent√§misstrategioiden tarkastelu', 'ca': 'Construïr una corpora representant de comunitats illiterates: Un examen dels reptes i estratègies de mitigació dels països en vies de desenvolupament', 'cs': 'Budování sboru reprezentantů z neliterovaných komunit: Přehled výzev a strategií zmírnění rozvojových zemí', 'ha': 'Builning Repository CorCorCorp from Illiterated Commons: A Refiew of Challenge and Mimitation Tracts for Developmenting Countries', 'sk': 'Izgradnja predstavniških korpusov iz nezakonitih skupnosti: pregled izzivov in strategij ublažitve za države v razvoju', 'jv': 'Gawe ngubung-Ngerawat representtative Côpèro Mulai nggawe komunitas: A Refawf Galanges lan mitigation Setungsatsi kanggo nggawe Gambaran kanggo Ketoké', 'he': 'בניית נציגת קורפורה מהקהילות בלתי-ספורתיות: עיקור של אתגרים וסטרטגיות ההקלה למדינות מתפתחות', 'bo': 'Building Representative Corpora from Illiterate Communities: A Reviewof Challenges and Mitigation Strategies for Developing Countries'}
{'en': 'Most well-established data collection methods currently adopted in NLP depend on the as- sumption of speaker literacy. Consequently, the collected corpora largely fail to represent swathes of the global population, which tend to be some of the most vulnerable and marginalised people in society, and often live in rural developing areas. Such underrepresented groups are thus not only ignored when making modeling and system design decisions, but also prevented from benefiting from development outcomes achieved through data-driven NLP. This paper aims to address the under-representation of illiterate communities in NLP corpora : we identify potential biases and ethical issues that might arise when collecting data from rural communities with high illiteracy rates in Low-Income Countries, and propose a set of practical mitigation strategies to help future work.', 'es': 'La mayoría de los métodos de recopilación de datos bien establecidos que se adoptan actualmente en la PNL dependen del supuesto de la alfabetización de los hablantes. En consecuencia, los corpus recopilados en gran medida no representan a sectores de la población mundial, que tienden a ser algunas de las personas más vulnerables y marginadas de la sociedad, y a menudo viven en áreas rurales en desarrollo. Por lo tanto, estos grupos subrepresentados no solo son ignorados al tomar decisiones de modelado y diseño de sistemas, sino que también se les impide beneficiarse de los resultados de desarrollo logrados a través de la PNL basada en datos. Este artículo tiene como objetivo abordar la subrepresentación de las comunidades analfabetas en los cuerpos de PNL: identificamos los posibles sesgos y problemas éticos que pueden surgir al recopilar datos de comunidades rurales con altas tasas de analfabetismo en países de bajos ingresos, y proponemos un conjunto de estrategias prácticas de mitigación para ayudar a trabajar en el futuro.', 'fr': "La plupart des méthodes de collecte de données bien établies actuellement adoptées en PNL dépendent de l'hypothèse de l'alphabétisation du locuteur. Par conséquent, les corpus collectés ne représentent pas une grande partie de la population mondiale, qui est généralement l'une des personnes les plus vulnérables et les plus marginalisées de la société, et qui vivent souvent dans des zones rurales en développement. Ces groupes sous-représentés sont donc non seulement ignorés lors de la prise de décisions de modélisation et de conception de systèmes, mais ils ne peuvent également pas bénéficier des résultats de développement obtenus grâce à la PNL basée sur les données. Ce document vise à aborder la sous-représentation des communautés analphabètes dans les corpus de PNL\xa0: nous identifions les biais potentiels et les problèmes éthiques qui peuvent survenir lors de la collecte de données auprès de communautés rurales ayant des taux d'analphabétisme élevés dans les pays à faible revenu, et proposons un ensemble de stratégies d'atténuation pratiques pour aider les futurs travaux.", 'ar': 'تعتمد معظم طرق جمع البيانات الراسخة المعتمدة حاليًا في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية على افتراض معرفة القراءة والكتابة للمتحدثين. ونتيجة لذلك ، فشلت الشركات المجمعة إلى حد كبير في تمثيل قطاعات من سكان العالم ، الذين يميلون إلى أن يكونوا بعض أكثر الأشخاص ضعفاً وتهميشاً في المجتمع ، وغالباً ما يعيشون في المناطق النامية الريفية. وبالتالي ، لا يتم تجاهل هذه المجموعات الممثلة تمثيلا ناقصًا عند اتخاذ قرارات النمذجة وتصميم النظام فحسب ، بل يتم أيضًا منعها من الاستفادة من نتائج التطوير التي يتم تحقيقها من خلال معالجة اللغات الطبيعية القائمة على البيانات. تهدف هذه الورقة إلى معالجة التمثيل الناقص للمجتمعات الأمية في مؤسسات البرمجة اللغوية العصبية: نحدد التحيزات المحتملة والقضايا الأخلاقية التي قد تنشأ عند جمع البيانات من المجتمعات الريفية ذات معدلات الأمية المرتفعة في البلدان منخفضة الدخل ، ونقترح مجموعة من استراتيجيات التخفيف العملية. للمساعدة في العمل في المستقبل.', 'pt': 'A maioria dos métodos de coleta de dados bem estabelecidos atualmente adotados em PNL dependem da suposição de alfabetização do falante. Consequentemente, os corpora coletados em grande parte não representam faixas da população global, que tendem a ser algumas das pessoas mais vulneráveis e marginalizadas da sociedade, e muitas vezes vivem em áreas rurais em desenvolvimento. Esses grupos sub-representados são, portanto, não apenas ignorados ao tomar decisões de modelagem e design de sistema, mas também impedidos de se beneficiar dos resultados de desenvolvimento alcançados por meio da PNL orientada por dados. Este artigo visa abordar a sub-representação de comunidades analfabetas em corpora de PNL: identificamos possíveis vieses e questões éticas que podem surgir ao coletar dados de comunidades rurais com altas taxas de analfabetismo em países de baixa renda e propomos um conjunto de estratégias práticas de mitigação para ajudar em trabalhos futuros.', 'ja': 'NLPで現在採用されているほとんどの確立されたデータ収集方法は、スピーカーリテラシーの総和に依存する。その結果、収集されたコーポラは、社会の中で最も脆弱で過疎化した人々である傾向があり、しばしば発展途上の農村部に住む世界的な人口の大部分を表すことができません。したがって、このような代表性の低いグループは、モデリングとシステム設計の決定を行う際に無視されるだけでなく、データ駆動型NLPを通じて達成された開発成果から利益を得ることを妨げられる。この論文は、NLP団体における文盲コミュニティの代表者不足に対処することを目的としている。私たちは、低所得国の文盲率の高い農村コミュニティからデータを収集する際に生じる可能性のあるバイアスと倫理的問題を特定し、将来の仕事を支援するための一連の実用的な緩和戦略を提案する。', 'zh': '方今NLP中多熟数,皆赖言者素养之总结。 故所集语料库不可为全球人口者,往往世之脆边缘化,常居田里。 是以群代表性不足者,非徒建模统之被忽视也,而无益于数NLP也。 本文旨决文盲社区在NLP语料库代表性不足:臣等定从低收入国文盲率高农村社区收数时有潜见道德,并陈缓策以助来者。', 'hi': 'एनएलपी में वर्तमान में अपनाई गई अधिकांश अच्छी तरह से स्थापित डेटा संग्रह विधियां वक्ता साक्षरता के संक्षेपण पर निर्भर करती हैं। नतीजतन, एकत्रित निगम काफी हद तक वैश्विक आबादी के swaths का प्रतिनिधित्व करने में विफल रहता है, जो समाज में सबसे कमजोर और हाशिए के लोगों में से कुछ होते हैं, और अक्सर ग्रामीण विकासशील क्षेत्रों में रहते हैं। इस प्रकार इस तरह के underrepresented समूहों को न केवल मॉडलिंग और सिस्टम डिजाइन निर्णय लेते समय अनदेखा किया जाता है, बल्कि डेटा-संचालित एनएलपी के माध्यम से प्राप्त विकास परिणामों से लाभ उठाने से भी रोका जाता है। इस पेपर का उद्देश्य एनएलपी कॉर्पोरेट में अनपढ़ समुदायों के कम प्रतिनिधित्व को संबोधित करना है: हम संभावित पूर्वाग्रहों और नैतिक मुद्दों की पहचान करते हैं जो कम आय वाले देशों में उच्च निरक्षरता दरों वाले ग्रामीण समुदायों से डेटा एकत्र करते समय उत्पन्न हो सकते हैं, और भविष्य के काम में मदद करने के लिए व्यावहारिक शमन रणनीतियों का एक सेट प्रस्तावित करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Большинство хорошо зарекомендовавших себя методов сбора данных, принятых в настоящее время в NLP, зависят от грамотности говорящих. Следовательно, собранные тела в значительной степени не представляют группы населения мира, которые, как правило, являются одними из наиболее уязвимых и маргинализированных людей в обществе и часто проживают в сельских развивающихся районах. Таким образом, такие недопредставленные группы не только игнорируются при принятии решений по моделированию и проектированию системы, но и лишены возможности извлекать выгоду из результатов развития, достигнутых с помощью NLP, основанной на данных. Настоящий документ направлен на решение проблемы недопредставленности неграмотных общин в корпусах НЛП: мы выявляем потенциальные предвзятости и этические проблемы, которые могут возникнуть при сборе данных в сельских общинах с высоким уровнем неграмотности в странах с низким уровнем дохода, и предлагаем набор практических стратегий смягчения последствий для содействия будущей работе.', 'ga': 'Braitheann an chuid is mó de na modhanna dea-bhunaithe bailithe sonraí a nglactar leo san NLP faoi láthair ar litearthacht an chainteora a mheas. Mar thoradh air sin, teipeann ar an gcorpas bailithe cuid mhór den daonra domhanda, a mbíonn de ghnáth ar chuid de na daoine is leochailí agus is imeallaithe sa tsochaí, agus a chónaíonn go minic i gceantair thuaithe i mbéal forbartha. Mar sin ní dhéantar neamhaird ar ghrúpaí tearcionadaithe den sórt sin agus iad ag déanamh cinntí samhaltaithe agus dearadh córais, ach cuirtear cosc orthu freisin leas a bhaint as torthaí forbartha a bhaintear amach trí NLP atá bunaithe ar shonraí. Tá sé mar aidhm ag an bpáipéar seo aghaidh a thabhairt ar ghannionadaíocht na bpobal neamhliteartha i gcorpora NLP: sainaithnímid laofachtaí féideartha agus saincheisteanna eiticiúla a d’fhéadfadh teacht chun cinn agus sonraí á mbailiú ó phobail tuaithe a bhfuil rátaí arda neamhlitearthachta acu i dTíortha ar Ioncam Íseal, agus molaimid sraith de straitéisí praiticiúla maolaithe. chun cabhrú le hobair amach anseo.', 'ka': 'NLP-ში მიღებული უფრო მსგავსი მონაცემები მონაცემების კოლექციის მეტი დაახლოებია, როგორც სიტყვების სიტყვებით. შემდეგ, კოლექცირებული კორპორა ძალიან არ შეუძლებელია გლობალური მოსახლეობის გარეშე, რომლებიც უფრო ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან და მარიზალური ადამიანებისგან იყოს საზოგადოებში, და ძალიან ცხოვ ამიტომ ასეთი ნაკლებად გამოსახულებული ჯგუფები არა მხოლოდ იგნორიურებულია, როდესაც მოდელირება და სისტემის დიზაინის განსახულებების განსახულებაში, მაგრამ გადარჩენა განვითარებას გასა ამ დოკუმენტის მიზეზი NLP კოპორაში არსებული საზოგადოებების უფრო გამოსახულება: ჩვენ განვისახულებთ პოტენტიკური საზოგადოება და ეტიკური პრობლემები, რომელიც შეიძლება იქნება, როდესაც საზოგადოებაში მონახულებული საზოგადოებების', 'el': 'Οι περισσότερες καθιερωμένες μέθοδοι συλλογής δεδομένων που υιοθετούνται σήμερα στο NLP εξαρτώνται από την κατανόηση του γραμματισμού των ομιλητών. Κατά συνέπεια, τα συλλεγόμενα σώματα δεν αντιπροσωπεύουν σε μεγάλο βαθμό τμήματα του παγκόσμιου πληθυσμού, οι οποίοι τείνουν να είναι μερικοί από τους πιο ευάλωτους και περιθωριοποιημένους ανθρώπους της κοινωνίας και συχνά ζουν σε αγροτικές αναπτυσσόμενες περιοχές. Τέτοιες υποεκπροσωπούμενες ομάδες δεν αγνοούνται μόνο κατά τη λήψη αποφάσεων μοντελοποίησης και σχεδιασμού συστημάτων, αλλά επίσης αποτρέπονται από το να επωφεληθούν από τα αποτελέσματα ανάπτυξης που επιτυγχάνονται μέσω της βασισμένης σε δεδομένα. Η παρούσα εργασία έχει ως στόχο να αντιμετωπίσει την υποεκπροσώπηση των αναλφάβητων κοινοτήτων στα σώματα: εντοπίζουμε πιθανές προκαταλήψεις και ηθικά ζητήματα που ενδέχεται να προκύψουν κατά τη συλλογή δεδομένων από αγροτικές κοινότητες με υψηλά ποσοστά αναλφαβητισμού σε χώρες χαμηλού εισοδήματος και προτείνουμε ένα σύνολο πρακτικών στρατηγικών μετριασμού για να βοηθήσουν το μελλοντικό έργο.', 'hu': 'Az NLP-ben jelenleg alkalmazott legtöbb jól bevált adatgyűjtési módszer az előadók műveltségének felhasználásától függ. Következésképpen az összegyűjtött corporák nagymértékben nem képesek a globális lakosság részét képviselni, amelyek általában a társadalom legkiszolgáltatottabb és legmarginalizáltabb emberei közé tartoznak, és gyakran vidékfejlesztő területeken élnek. Az ilyen alulreprezentált csoportokat tehát nemcsak a modellezési és rendszertervezési döntések meghozatala során figyelmen kívül hagyják, hanem megakadályozzák, hogy az adatközpontú NLP-n keresztül elért fejlesztési eredményekből profitáljanak. A tanulmány célja, hogy foglalkozzon az írástudatlan közösségek alulreprezentáltságával az NLP corporákban: azonosítjuk a potenciális elfogultságokat és etikai kérdéseket, amelyek felmerülhetnek az alacsony jövedelmű országokban magas írástudatlansági aránnyal rendelkező vidéki közösségektől származó adatok gyűjtése során, valamint gyakorlati enyhítési stratégiákat javasolunk a jövőbeli munka elősegítésére.', 'it': 'La maggior parte dei metodi consolidati di raccolta dati attualmente adottati nel PNL dipende dal consumo di alfabetizzazione degli oratori. Di conseguenza, i corpora raccolti non sono in gran parte in grado di rappresentare fasce della popolazione globale, che tendono ad essere alcune delle persone più vulnerabili ed emarginate della società, e spesso vivono nelle aree rurali in via di sviluppo. Tali gruppi sottorappresentati non vengono quindi ignorati solo quando prendono decisioni di modellazione e progettazione del sistema, ma anche impediti di beneficiare dei risultati di sviluppo raggiunti attraverso NLP basato sui dati. Questo articolo mira ad affrontare la sottorappresentazione delle comunità analfabete nei corpora NLP: identifichiamo potenziali pregiudizi e questioni etiche che potrebbero sorgere quando raccogliamo dati da comunità rurali con alti tassi di analfabetismo nei Paesi a basso reddito, e proponiamo una serie di strategie pratiche di mitigazione per aiutare il lavoro futuro.', 'kk': 'NLP- де қолданылатын ең жақсы құрылған деректер жинақтау әдістері сөздердің әріптеріне тәуелді. Сондықтан, жинақталған корпора әлемдегі адамдардың көпшілігін көрсетуге болмайды. Бұл көпшілікті қоғамдағы ең уәсілікті және көпшілікті адамдардың көпшілігі болып, көпшілікті Бұл төменгі топтарды тек модель мен жүйелік құрылғының шешімдері жасағанда елемейді, сонымен қатар, деректерді басқару NLP арқылы жасау нәтижелерінен пайдалануға болмайды. Бұл қағаз NLP корпорадағы негізгі корпорадағы жалғыз компаттардың төменгі таңбалау үшін мақсат береді: біз келесі жұмыстың көмектесу үшін көмектесетін балалардың деректерін жинақтау үшін көмектесетін жұмыстардың бағдарламаларды жұмыс істеу ү', 'lt': 'Dauguma gerai nustatytų duomenų rinkimo metodų, šiuo metu taikomų NLP, priklauso nuo kalbėtojų raštingumo suvestinės. Taigi surinkti korporai iš esmės nepakankamai atstovauja pasaulio gyventojų, kurie paprastai yra kai kurie labiausiai pažeidžiami ir socialiai atskirti gyventojai ir dažnai gyvena kaimo plėtros vietovėse. Taigi tokios nepakankamai atstovaujamos grupės ignoruojamos ne tik priimant modeliavimo ir sistemos projektavimo sprendimus, bet ir neleidžiama pasinaudoti vystymosi rezultatais, pasiektais naudojant duomenų pagrindu grindžiamą NLP. Šiame dokumente siekiama išspręsti nepakankamą analfabetiškų bendruomenių atstovavimą NLP korporoje: nustatome galimus šalutinius aspektus ir etikos klausimus, kurie gali kilti renkant duomenis iš kaimo bendruomenių, kurių analfabetiškumo lygis yra didelis mažas pajamas gaunančiose šalyse, ir siūlome praktines mažinimo strategijas, kurios padėtų ateityje dirbti.', 'mk': 'Повеќето добро воспоставени методи за собирање податоци кои моментно се усвоени во НЛП зависат од сумирањето на говорната литература. Како резултат на тоа, собраниот корпора во голема мера не претставува групи од глобалното население, кое навикнува да се некои од најранливите и најмаргинализираните луѓе во општеството и честопати живее во руралните области во развој. Таквите недопретставени групи не се игнорираат само при донесувањето одлуки за моделирање и дизајнирање на системот, туку и ги спречуваат користите од резултатите на развојот постигнати преку НЛП врз основа на податоци. Овој документ има за цел да се справи со недостатокот на претставуваое на невозначените заедници во корпората НЛП: идентификуваме потенцијални предрасуди и етички прашања кои би можеле да се појават кога се собираат податоци од руралните заедници со високи стапки на невозначеност во земјите со ниски приходи, и предложуваме на', 'mt': 'Il-metodi l-aktar stabbiliti għall-ġbir tad-dejta adottati bħalissa fil-NLP jiddependu fuq is-sommarju tal-litteriżmu tal-kelliema. Konsegwentement, il-korpura miġbura fil-biċċa l-kbira tonqos milli tirrappreżenta l-biċċa l-kbira tal-popolazzjoni globali, li għandhom it-tendenza li jkunu wħud mill-persuni l-aktar vulnerabbli u marġinalizzati fis-soċjetà, u spiss jgħixu f’żoni rurali li qed jiżviluppaw. Dawn il-gruppi sottorappreżentati għalhekk mhumiex biss injorati meta jittieħdu deċiżjonijiet dwar l-immudellar u d-disinn tas-sistema, iżda wkoll ma jkunux jistgħu jibbenefikaw mir-riżultati tal-iżvilupp miksuba permezz ta’ NLP mmexxi mid-dejta. Dan id-dokument għandu l-għan li jindirizza n-nuqqas ta’ rappreżentanza tal-komunitajiet analfabetiċi fil-korpura NLP: nidentifikaw preġudizzji potenzjali u kwistjonijiet etiċi li jistgħu jinqalgħu meta niġbru dejta minn komunitajiet rurali b’rati għoljin ta’ analfabetiżmu fil-Pajjiżi bi Dħul Baxx, u nipproponu sett ta’ strateġiji prattiċi ta’ mitigazzjoni biex jgħinu x-xogħol futur.', 'no': 'Dei mest godsette datasamlingsmetode som er godtatt i NLP er avhengig av samling av tale litteratur. Dette er derfor det samlinga korpora ikkje i stort grad representerer swathes av den globale befolkningen, som tenderer til å vera nokre av dei mest sårbare og marginaliserte menneskene i samfunnet, og ofte lever i landutviklingsplanene. Desse underrepresenterte gruppene vert derfor ikkje berre ignorert når modellering og system design avgjøringar gjer, men også hindra at utviklingar av utviklingslinjer er nådd gjennom NLP-driving av data. Denne papiret måtar å handtera underrepresentasjonen av illeterate fellesskap i NLP-korpora: vi identifiserer potensielle forsiktigheter og etiske problemer som kan oppstå når du samler data frå landbruk med høg illiteracy rate i landene med lav innkomme, og foreslår ein set av praktiske målingsstrategi for å hjelpa framtidige arbeid.', 'mn': 'Одоо NLP-д хэрэглэгдсэн хамгийн сайн байгуулсан өгөгдлийн цуглуулалтын аргыг илтгэгчдийн бичиг үсэг дээр хамаарна. Үүний үр дүнд цуглуулсан корпораци дэлхийн хүн амын хамгийн эмзэг, хамааралтай хүмүүсийн хэсгийг илэрхийлж чадахгүй, ихэвчлэн хөдөлгөөн хөгжиж буй хэсэгт амьдардаг. Тиймээс эдгээр багтаасан бүлгүүд зөвхөн загвар, системийн дизайны шийдвэр гаргах үед үгүй, мөн хөгжлийн үр дүнээс ашиглах боломжтой болно. Энэ сэтгүүл нь NLP корпоратын бичигдэг нийгмийн бага зэрэг үзүүлэлт хийх зорилго юм: бид тосгоны нийгмийн мэдээллийг бага орлоготой улс орнуудад цуглуулж, ирээдүйн ажилд тусалдаг дасгал хөгжүүлэх стратегийг олон дасгал хөгжүүлэх боломжтой байдал болон этикийн асуу', 'ro': 'Cele mai bine stabilite metode de colectare a datelor adoptate în prezent în PNL depind de suma de alfabetizare a vorbitorilor. În consecință, corporele colectate nu reușesc în mare măsură să reprezinte părți ale populației globale, care tind să fie unii dintre cei mai vulnerabili și marginalizați oameni din societate și trăiesc adesea în zone de dezvoltare rurală. Astfel de grupuri subreprezentate nu numai că sunt ignorate atunci când iau decizii de modelare și proiectare a sistemului, ci și împiedicate să beneficieze de rezultatele dezvoltării obținute prin PNL bazat pe date. Această lucrare își propune să abordeze subreprezentarea comunităților analfabete în corporele PNL: identificăm potențialele prejudecăți și probleme etice care ar putea apărea atunci când colectăm date de la comunitățile rurale cu rate ridicate de analfabetism în țările cu venituri scăzute și propunem un set de strategii practice de atenuare a activității viitoare.', 'ml': 'NLP-ല്\u200d നിലവില്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട ഏറ്റവും നല്ല ഡേറ്റാ സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d സ്പേക്ടര്\u200d സാഹിത്യത്തി അതുകൊണ്ട് സമൂഹത്തിലെ ഏറ്റവും അപകടത്തില്\u200d കൂട്ടിയ കോര്\u200dപ്പോരാ ലോകത്തിന്\u200dറെ സ്വാറ്റുകളെ പ്രതിനിധിക്കാന്\u200d പരാജയപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് സമൂഹത്തില്\u200d ഏറ്റവ ഇങ്ങനെ പ്രതിനിധിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഗ്രൂപ്പുകള്\u200d മോഡലിങ്ങും സിസ്റ്റം ഡിസൈനിങ്ങളുടെ തീരുമാനങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d മാത്രമല്ല, വി ഈ പേപ്പറിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യമാണ് NLP കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയിലെ വിവരമില്ലാത്ത സമൂഹത്തിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികളെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നത്: ഭാവിയുടെ ജോലിക്ക് സഹായിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള പ്രശ്നങ്ങളും സാധ്യതക', 'ms': 'Most well-established data collection methods currently adopted in NLP depend on the as- sumption of speaker literacy.  Oleh itu, korpra yang dikumpulkan kebanyakan gagal mewakili kumpulan populasi global, yang cenderung menjadi sebahagian dari orang yang paling rentan dan marginalis dalam masyarakat, dan sering tinggal di kawasan pembangunan pedesaan. Kumpulan-kumpulan yang tidak diwakili secara langsung tidak hanya diabaikan semasa membuat keputusan model dan desain sistem, tetapi juga diharamkan daripada mengambil keuntungan dari hasil pembangunan yang dicapai melalui NLP dipandu data. Kertas ini bertujuan untuk mengatasi ketidakmewakilan komuniti-komuniti yang tidak sah di korpra NLP: kita mengenalpasti bias potensi dan isu etika yang mungkin muncul apabila mengumpulkan data dari komuniti-komuniti pedesaan dengan kadar analfabetisme tinggi di negara-negara yang mempunyai pendapatan rendah, dan melaporkan satu set strategi perlawanan praktik untuk membantu kerja masa depan.', 'pl': 'Najbardziej ugruntowane metody gromadzenia danych przyjęte obecnie w NLP zależą od oceny umiejętności mówców. W związku z tym zebrane korpusy w dużej mierze nie reprezentują części ludności światowej, która jest zwykle jedną z najbardziej narażonych i zmarginalizowanych osób w społeczeństwie i często mieszka na obszarach rozwijających się na obszarach wiejskich. Takie niedostatecznie reprezentowane grupy są zatem nie tylko ignorowane podczas podejmowania decyzji o modelowaniu i projektowaniu systemu, ale także uniemożliwiają korzystanie z wyników rozwoju osiągniętych za pomocą opartego na danych NLP. Niniejszy artykuł ma na celu zajęcie się niedostateczną reprezentacją społeczności analfabetycznych w korporach NLP: identyfikujemy potencjalne uprzedzenia i kwestie etyczne, które mogą pojawić się podczas gromadzenia danych ze społeczności wiejskich o wysokim wskaźniku analfabetyzmu w krajach o niskim dochodzie, oraz proponujemy zestaw praktycznych strategii łagodzenia działań mających pomóc w przyszłej pracy.', 'si': 'Name ඉතින්, සංගුණු කාර්පෝරා ගොඩක් අසාර්ථක විශේෂ ජාතික විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරන්න බැරි වුණා, ඒ වගේම සමාජයේ සැමැත්තම් අ මෙච්චර ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන කණ්ඩායමක් නොවෙන්නේ මොඩේල් එක්ක පද්ධති විනිශ්චාරය සහ පද්ධති විනිශ්චාරය තීරණය කරන්න විතරය මේ පැත්තේ අදහස් කරනවා NLP කොර්පෝරාවේ නිර්මාණිත සමාජාත්මක අඩු ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරගන්න: අපි ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණ ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ', 'so': "Inta ugu badan qaababka soo ururista macluumaadka ee aad u sahlan karto ee hada lagu soo qaaday NLP waxay ku xiran tahay sawirka hadalka. Sababtaas darteed shirkadaha la soo ururiyey waxay u baaqan waayeen inay ka mid yihiin dadka bulshada ugu dhaqdhaqaaqa iyo kuwa ku dhaqdhaqaaqa, inta badan waxay deggan yihiin degmooyinka dhaqaalaha. Sidaa darteed kooxo caynkaas ah laguma jeedo marka lagu sameeyo go'aano sameynta sameynta iyo qorsheynta nidaamka, laakiin waxaa kaloo laga diiday inay ka faa’iido ka helaan dhamaadka horumarinta ee lagu soo gudbiyey ALP. Qoraalkan waxaa loola jeedaa in lagu sheekeysto bulshada aan cilmi lahayn ee shirkadda NLP: waxaynu aqoonsanaynaa qalloocyada suurtagalka ah iyo arimaha asalka ah oo ka soo bixi karta marka laga soo ururiyo macluumaadka bulshada tuulooyinka oo ay ka soo ururiyaan qiimaha dhaqanka culus ee wadamada hoose-dakhliga, waxaana soo jeedinayaa koob qaab qaab ah oo ku saabsan isticmaalka jiidanka si uu u caawi", 'sv': 'De flesta väletablerade datainsamlingsmetoder som för närvarande används inom det nationella handlingsprogrammet beror på att talarkunskaper konsumeras. Följaktligen utgör de insamlade korporarna i stort sett inte delar av den globala befolkningen, som tenderar att vara några av de mest utsatta och marginaliserade människorna i samhället och ofta bor i landsbygdsområden. Sådana underrepresenterade grupper ignoreras därför inte bara när de fattar modellerings- och systemdesignbeslut, utan hindras också från att dra nytta av utvecklingsresultat som uppnåtts genom datadriven NLP. Denna uppsats syftar till att ta itu med underrepresentationen av analfabeter i NLP corpora: vi identifierar potentiella fördomar och etiska frågor som kan uppstå när vi samlar in data från landsbygdssamhällen med hög analfabetism frekvens i låginkomstländer, och föreslår en uppsättning praktiska lindringsstrategier för att hjälpa framtida arbete.', 'ta': 'NLP-ல் தற்போது தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட மிக நன்றாக நிறுவப்பட்ட தரவு தொகுப்பு முறைமைகளை பேச்சாளர் எழுத்துருவா அதனால், சேகரிக்கப்பட்ட நிறுவனம் பெரும்பாலாகவே உலக மக்களின் மாற்றங்களை குறிப்பிட முடியவில்லை, அது சமூகத்தில் மிகவும் பாதிக்கப்பட்ட மற்றும் குழப்பமான மக் இவ்வாறு குழுக்கள் மாதிரி மற்றும் கணினி வடிவமைப்பு தீர்வுகளை உருவாக்கும்போது புறக்கணிக்கப்படவில்லை, ஆனால் தரவு இயக்கப்பட்ட NLP ம இந்த காகிதத்திற்கு NLP நிறுவனத்தில் உள்ள கல்வியறிவில்லாத சமூகத்தின் கீழ் பிரதிநிதியில் உள்ள கூட்டத்திற்கு எதிர்காலத்திற்கு உதவி செய்யும் போது நாம் சாத்தியமான பிரச்சனைகளை', 'ur': 'ان سے زیادہ اچھا استعمال کیا گیا ڈیٹ کالکتر طریقے جنہیں NLP میں فعلا پذیرا گیا ہے، اسپیرٹر کی صحیح تعلیم پر اعتماد ہے. لہٰذا، جمع کئے ہوئے شرکت کی زیادہ ناکام ہوتی ہے جہان میں سب سے زیادہ کمزور اور ناکام لوگوں میں سے ہے، اور اکثر گاؤں کے گھوپ کے منطقه میں زندگی کرتے ہیں. اس طرح ان کم نمایش گروہوں کو صرف نمایش اور سیستم طراحی فیصلہ کرنے کے موقع غافل کر دیا جاتا ہے، بلکہ ان کا فائدہ بھی دینے کے نتیجے سے منع کر دیا جاتا ہے جو ڈیٹا کی NLP کے ذریعہ پہنچے ہیں. اس کاغذ کا ارادہ یہ ہے کہ NLP شرکت میں غیر قابل تعلیم کی کم تعلیم کرنے کی کوشش کریں: ہم امکانات غیر قابل تعلیم اور اخلاقی مسئلہ کو پہچان لیتے ہیں جو اس وقت ہوسکتے ہیں جب کائنات المجتمعات سے اوپر غیر قابل تعلیم کے درجے کے ساتھ بہت سی غیر قابل تعلیم رکھتے ہیں اور آینده کام کی', 'sr': 'Najdobro uspostavljene metode prikupljanja podataka koje trenutno usvojavaju u NLP ovisi o sumpciji literatnosti govornika. Stoga, skupljena korpora u velikoj meri ne predstavlja zamke globalne populacije, koje su navodno neki od najranjivijih i marginaliziranijih ljudi u društvu, i često žive u ruralnim razvojnim područjima. Takve nepreprezentatne grupe se tako ne samo ignoriraju kada donose odluke o modelima i dizajnu sistema, nego takođe sprječavaju koristi od rezultata razvoja postignute putem NLP podataka. Ovaj papir je cilj da se riješimo nepreprezentacijom nezanimljivih zajednica u korporaciji NLP-a: identifikujemo potencijalne predrasude i etičke pitanja koje bi se mogle pojaviti kada skupljamo podatke iz ruralnih zajednica sa visokim stopama nezanimljivosti u zemljama niskih prihoda i predlažemo skup praktičnih strategija za smanjenje budućeg rada.', 'uz': "Name Шундай қилиб, тўпланган kompaniya dunyo jamoasidagi ko'pchilik jamiyatlaridagi eng odamlarning bir necha bo'lishi mumkin, va ko'pincha tajriba tajribalarda yashaydi. Шундай қилиб, бу тарқатиладиган гуруҳлар фақат model ва система dizayning xususiyatlarini yaratishda eʼtibor berilmagan emas, balки ҳам маълумотлар ўзгартирилган NLP томонидан топилган natijalardan foydalanishdan foydalanishdan iborat. Bu qogʻoz NLP kompaniyadagi haqiqiqiy jamiyatlarni tashkilotga qarashga ega bo'ladi: biz kelajak ishga yordam beradigan davlat jamiyatlaridagi taʼlumotlarni ajratish mumkin va etik muammolarni ko'rsatuvchimiz mumkin.", 'vi': 'Hầu hết các phương pháp thu thập dữ liệu được thiết lập lâu dài được sử dụng tại NMB phụ thuộc vào việc sử dụng văn học diễn giả. Do đó, cơ thể đã thu thập hầu như không thể đại diện cho một số lượng lớn dân số to àn cầu, mà thường là những người dễ bị tổn thương và bị cô lập hơn trong xã hội, và thường sống ở khu vực phát triển nông nghiệp. Những nhóm kém đại diện như vậy không chỉ bị bỏ qua khi đưa ra quyết định mô hình và thiết kế hệ thống, mà còn bị ngăn không được lợi dụng kết quả phát triển được đạt qua ngôn ngữ tư bản dữ liệu. Mục tiêu của bài báo này là đối phó với sự thiếu đại diện của các cộng đồng ngu dốt tại bang Nhất. Chúng tôi xác định các giả thuyết và các vấn đề đạo đức có thể xuất hiện khi thu thập dữ liệu từ các cộng đồng nông thôn có tỷ lệ ngu dốt cao ở các quốc gia nghèo, và đề xuất một số phương pháp giảm bớt thực tế để giúp công việc tương lai.', 'bg': 'Повечето добре установени методи за събиране на данни, възприети понастоящем в НЛП, зависят от обобщаването на грамотността на говорителите. Следователно събраните корпуси до голяма степен не представляват части от световното население, което обикновено е едни от най-уязвимите и маргинализирани хора в обществото и често живее в развиващите се селски райони. По този начин такива слабо представени групи не само се пренебрегват при вземането на решения за моделиране и проектиране на системи, но и се възпрепятства да се възползват от резултатите от развитието, постигнати чрез НЛП, базирани на данни. Настоящата статия има за цел да разгледа недостатъчното представителство на неграмотните общности в корпорациите на НЛП: идентифицираме потенциалните пристрастия и етични въпроси, които биха могли да възникнат при събирането на данни от селските общности с висок процент на неграмотност в страните с ниски доходи, и предлагаме набор от практически стратегии за смекчаване на последиците от бъдещата работа.', 'nl': 'De meeste bekende methoden voor gegevensverzameling die momenteel in NLP worden toegepast, zijn afhankelijk van de mate waarin spreker geletterd wordt. Bijgevolg vertegenwoordigen de verzamelde corpora grotendeels geen delen van de wereldbevolking, die doorgaans tot de meest kwetsbare en gemarginaliseerde mensen in de samenleving behoren en vaak in plattelandsgebieden wonen. Dergelijke ondervertegenwoordigde groepen worden dus niet alleen genegeerd bij het nemen van modellerings- en systeemontwerpbeslissingen, maar ook verhinderd te profiteren van ontwikkelingsresultaten die worden bereikt door datagedreven NLP. Dit document is bedoeld om de ondervertegenwoordiging van analfabetische gemeenschappen in NLP corpora aan te pakken: we identificeren potentiële vooroordelen en ethische problemen die kunnen ontstaan bij het verzamelen van gegevens van plattelandsgemeenschappen met een hoog analfabetiteitspercentage in lage inkomenslanden, en stellen een reeks praktische mitigatiestrategieën voor om toekomstig werk te helpen.', 'da': 'De fleste veletablerede dataindsamlingsmetoder, der i øjeblikket anvendes i NLP, afhænger af, hvor mange talere har kendskab til. Derfor repræsenterer de indsamlede korpora stort set ikke dele af den globale befolkning, som har tendens til at være nogle af de mest sårbare og marginaliserede mennesker i samfundet, og som ofte bor i landdistrikter med udvikling. Sådanne underrepræsenterede grupper ignoreres således ikke kun, når de træffer modellerings- og systemdesignbeslutninger, men forhindres også i at drage fordel af udviklingsresultater opnået gennem datadrevet NLP. Denne artikel har til formål at behandle underrepræsentationen af analfabeter i NLP corpora: Vi identificerer potentielle fordomme og etiske spørgsmål, der kan opstå, når vi indsamler data fra landdistrikter med høj analfabetisme rater i lavindkomstlande, og foreslår et sæt praktiske afbødningsstrategier til at hjælpe fremtidigt arbejde.', 'de': 'Die meisten etablierten Datenerhebungsmethoden, die derzeit im NLP angewandt werden, hängen von der Einschätzung der Rednerkompetenz ab. Folglich repräsentieren die gesammelten Korpora weitgehend Teile der Weltbevölkerung, die in der Regel zu den verwundbarsten und marginalisierten Menschen in der Gesellschaft gehören und häufig in ländlichen Entwicklungsgebieten leben. Solche unterrepräsentierten Gruppen werden somit nicht nur bei Modellierungs- und Systementwurfsentscheidungen ignoriert, sondern auch daran gehindert, von Entwicklungsergebnissen zu profitieren, die durch datengesteuertes NLP erzielt werden. Dieses Papier zielt darauf ab, die Unterrepräsentation analphabetischer Gemeinschaften in NLP-Korpora zu adressieren: Wir identifizieren potenzielle Verzerrungen und ethische Probleme, die bei der Erfassung von Daten aus ländlichen Gemeinschaften mit hohen Analphabetenquoten in Ländern mit niedrigem Einkommen auftreten könnten, und schlagen eine Reihe praktischer Minderungsstrategien vor, um zukünftige Arbeit zu unterstützen.', 'ko': '현재 NLP에서 채택하고 있는 대부분의 성숙한 데이터 수집 방법은 말하는 사람의 읽기와 쓰기 능력의 소모에 의존한다.따라서 수집된 어료고는 어느 정도에 전 세계 인구의 일부분을 대표할 수 없다. 이런 인구는 사회에서 가장 취약하고 변두리화된 사람들이며 농촌 발전 지역에서 생활한다.따라서 이들 대표적으로 부족한 집단은 모델링과 시스템 설계 결정을 내릴 때 무시될 뿐만 아니라 데이터로 구동되는 NLP를 통해 이루어진 개발 성과에서 이득을 볼 수 없다.본고는 NLP 자료 라이브러리에서 중국어 맹인 지역사회의 대표적 부족 문제를 해결하고자 한다. 우리는 저소득 국가의 문맹률이 높은 농촌 지역사회에서 데이터를 수집할 때 발생할 수 있는 잠재적인 편견과 도덕적 문제를 확정하고 실행 가능한 완화 전략을 제시하여 미래의 업무를 돕도록 한다.', 'fa': 'بیشتر روش\u200cهای جمع داده\u200cهای ثابت شده\u200cای که در حال حاضر در NLP پذیرفته شده بستگی دارند از جمع کردن نوشته\u200cهای صحبت کننده. بنابراین، شرکت جمع شده بسیار زیادی از نمایش جامعه\u200cهای جمعیت جهانی را شکست نمی\u200cدهد، که معمولاً بعضی از مردم آسیب\u200cآسیب\u200cترین و محدودیت\u200cترین در جامعه هستند، و اغلب در منطقه\u200cهای توسعه روستایی زندگی می\u200cکنند. این گروه\u200cهای کم نماینده\u200cشده\u200cاند، نه تنها وقتی تصمیم\u200cگیری\u200cهای مدل\u200cسازی و طراحی سیستم را نادیده گرفته می\u200cشوند، بلکه از نتایج\u200cهای توسعه\u200cسازی که از طریق NLP به داده\u200cها رسیده می\u200cشود، مانع می\u200cشوند. این کاغذ را هدف می\u200cدهد که به زیر نمایش جامعه\u200cهای غیرقانونی در شرکت NLP بررسی کند: ما مشکلات پتانسیل و اخلاقی را شناسایی می\u200cکنیم که ممکن است در زمان جمع کردن داده\u200cها از جامعه\u200cهای روستایی با نرخ غیرقانونی بالا در کشورهای کم درآمد و پیشنهاد کردن مجموعه استراتژی\u200cهای کم\u200cسازی', 'sw': 'njia za mkusanyiko wa data zilizowekwa vizuri hivi sasa zilizochukuliwa katika NLP zinategemea kwa ufafanuzi wa lugha. Kwa hiyo, makampuni yaliyokusanyika yameshindwa kuwakilisha makundi ya watu duniani, ambayo huwa ni baadhi ya watu walio hatarini na walio uharibifu katika jamii, na mara nyingi wanaishi katika maeneo yanayoendelea vijijini. Makundi haya yasiyo na uwakilishi si tu yanapotoshwa pale tu wakifanya maamuzi na mifumo ya ubunifu, bali pia yanazuia kuendelea na matokeo ya maendeleo yanayopata kupitia NLP inayoendeshwa na data. Gazeti hili linalenga kuwasiliana na jamii isiyo na uwakilishi katika kampuni ya NLP: tunatambua uwezekano wa upendeleo na masuala ya maadili yanayoweza kutokea wakati wa kukusanya taarifa kutoka jamii ya vijijini yenye kiwango kikubwa cha ufahamu katika nchi za chini, na kupendekeza mkakati wa mitandao ya usambazaji ili kusaidia kazi za baadae.', 'tr': "Häzirki NLP'da ullanýan iň gowy möhüm maglumaty ýygnak yöntemlerine görä çykyş edebiýatlygyň koplamasyna bağlı. Şol sebäpli toplanýan korpora dünýädäki ilat sanlarynyň iň ýarawsyz we iň ýarawsyz adamlarynyň käbirleri bolup bilmeýär we köplenç ösümli böleklerde ýaşaýarlar. Böylece aşa temsil edilen toparlar diňe modellendirmek we sistem dizayn kararlaryny çykarmak wagtynda ýok edilmez, ýöne data-tarapyndan NLP tarapyndan faydalandyrmakdan çykarmaýar. Bu kagyz NLP korporasynda ýazmaz toparlaryň iň azyndan täsirlenmegi amaçlandyrýar: biz bugün ýerlik toparlardan ýazmazlyk ýokary hökmünde maglumatlary toplamak üçin gelejek işe kömek etmek üçin bir topar praktik taýýarlama stratejiklerini tassyklapýarys.", 'sq': 'Shumë metoda të përcaktuara të mbledhjes së të dhënave të miratuara aktualisht në NLP varen nga përmbledhja e letërsisë së zëdhënësve. Për shkak të kësaj, korpra e mbledhur në mënyrë të madhe nuk përfaqëson pjesë të popullsisë globale, e cila ka tendencë të jetë disa nga njerëzit më të prekshëm dhe më të marginalizuar në shoqëri dhe shpesh jeton në zonat rurale në zhvillim. Grupe të tilla të nënpërfaqësuara nuk injorohen kështu vetëm kur marrin vendime modelimi dhe projektimi i sistemit, por ndalohen gjithashtu të përfitojnë nga rezultatet e zhvillimit të arritur nëpërmjet NLP të bazuar në të dhëna. Ky dokument synon të trajtojë nënpërfaqësimin e komuniteteve analfabete në korprën NLP: ne identifikojmë paragjykime të mundshme dhe çështje etike që mund të ngrihen kur mbledhin të dhëna nga komunitetet rurale me norma të larta analfabetizmi në vendet me të ardhura të ulta dhe propozojmë një sërë strategjish praktike për lehtësimin për të ndihmuar punën e ardhshme.', 'hr': 'Najdobro uspostavljene metode prikupljanja podataka koji su trenutno usvojeni u NLP ovisi o sumpciji literatnosti govornika. Stoga, skupljena tijela u velikoj mjeri ne predstavlja zamjene globalnog stanovništva, koje su navodno neki od najranjivijih i marginaliziranijih ljudi u društvu i često žive u ruralnim razvojnim područjima. Takve nepreprezentatne skupine se tako ne samo ignoriraju kada donose odluke o modelima i dizajnu sustava, nego također sprječavaju koristiti od rezultata razvoja postignute putem NLP podataka. U ovom dokumentu se cilja riješiti manje predstavljanja neznanih zajednica u tijelu NLP-a: identificiramo potencijalne predrasude i etičke pitanja koje bi se mogle pojaviti pri skupljanju podataka iz ruralnih zajednica sa visokim stopama neznanja u zemljama niskog prihoda i predlažemo skup praktičnih strategija za smanjenje budućeg rada.', 'id': 'Kebanyakan metode koleksi data yang ditetapkan dengan baik saat ini diadopsi di NLP tergantung pada sebagai- sumpsi kebijaksanaan pembicara. Oleh karena itu, korpra yang dikumpulkan kebanyakan gagal mewakili banyak populasi global, yang cenderung menjadi salah satu orang yang paling rentan dan marginalisasi di masyarakat, dan sering tinggal di daerah pengembangan pedesaan. Kelompok-kelompok yang kurang mewakili tidak hanya diabaikan ketika membuat keputusan model dan desain sistem, tetapi juga mencegah dari keuntungan dari hasil perkembangan yang dicapai melalui NLP yang didorong data. Kertas ini bertujuan untuk mengatasi ketidakwakilan komunitas analfabet di korpra NLP: kami mengidentifikasi potensial biases dan masalah etika yang mungkin muncul ketika mengumpulkan data dari komunitas pedesaan dengan tingkat analfabetisme tinggi di negara-negara yang punya pendapatan rendah, dan melamar set strategi penahanan praktis untuk membantu kerja di masa depan.', 'am': 'በNLP ውስጥ አሁን የተመረጠውን የዳታ ማሰብሰብ ዘዴዎች በንግግር ቃላት እንደተሳካ ነው፡፡ ስለዚህ የተሰበሰቡት ኮርፖርት የዓለምአቀፍ ሕዝብ ተቃውሞ ማቆየት አይቻሉም፤ ይህ ማኅበረሰብ ከደካማዎች እና የተገደሉ ሰዎች እና ብዙ ጊዜም በመንደሮች የሚኖሩ ናቸው፡፡ እንደዚህ ያሉ አካባቢዎች ተሟጋቾች በሥርዓት እና የስርዓት ግንኙነቶችን በመጥረቱ ብቻ አይተወሉም፥ ነገር ግን ከዳታ-driven NLP የተደረገውን ውጤቶች ከመጠቀም እንዳይከለክሉ ነው፡፡ ይህ ገጽ በNLP ኮርፖራ ውስጥ ያሉትን የቋንቋዎች ማህበረሰብ ማቀናቀል ነው፡፡', 'az': 'NLP içində müəyyən edilən ən ən gözəl qurulmuş məlumat koleksiyonu metodlarına bağlı olar. Buna görə də toplanmış korpora küresel nüfusunun ən zəif və dəyərli insanlardan bəzisini göstərməyə çalışmır və çox zaman köylərin gelişmiş bölgelerində yaşayarlar. Beləliklə, bu qruplar modellik və sistem dizayn kararlarını verməkdə yalnız məlumatları və məlumatları təşkil edən NLP vasitəsilə müvəffəqiyyətlərdən faydalanmağa mane olmuşdur. Bu kağıt NLP korporasında yazılmaz toplumların a şağı göstərilməsinə məcburiyyət edir: biz belə olaraq, köylərdən məlumatları yüksək yazılmaz hüquqları ilə birləşdirib gələcək işlərə kömək etmək üçün mümkün olaraq olaraq olaraq mümkün olaraq mümkün olaraq təsirlər və etik məsələləri tanıyırıq.', 'bn': 'এনএলপিতে বর্তমানে নির্ধারিত তথ্য সংগ্রহের সবচেয়ে ভালোভাবে নির্ধারিত উপায় নির্ভর করে কথাবার্তার সাহিত্য হ Consequently, the collected corpora largely fail to represent swathes of the global population, which tend to be some of the most vulnerable and marginalised people in society, and often live in rural developing areas.  এরকম প্রতিনিধিত্বিত গ্রুপ কেবল মডেলিং এবং সিস্টেম ডিজাইনের সিদ্ধান্ত নিয়ে উপেক্ষা করা হচ্ছে না, কিন্তু ডাটা পরিচালিত এনএলপি  এনএলপি কোর্পোরায় শিক্ষিত সম্প্রদায়ের নীচে প্রতিনিধিত্বের উদ্দেশ্যে এই প্রতিনিধিত্বের উদ্দেশ্য: আমরা সম্ভাব্য বৈষম্য এবং নৈতিক বিষয় চিহ্নিত করি যা গ্রামী সম্প্রদায়ের তথ্য সংগ', 'ca': "Els mètodes de col·lecció de dades actualment adoptats en NLP depenen de la suposició de l'alfabetització dels oradors. En conseqüència, els corpores recollits no representen en gran part grans parts de la població mundial, que tendeixen a ser algunes de les persones més vulnerables i marginades de la societat, i sovint viuen en àrees rurals en desenvolupament. Així doncs, aquests grups subrepresentats no són només ignorats quan prenen decisions de modelació i disseny del sistema, sinó també impedeixen beneficiar-se dels resultats de desenvolupament aconseguits a través de NLP basat en les dades. Aquest paper té l'objectiu d'abordar la insuficient representació de comunitats analfabetes a la corpora de NLP: identifiquem potencials prejudicis i qüestions ètiques que podrien sorgir al recollir dades de comunitats rurals amb alts índics d'analfabetisme en països amb baix ingressos, i proposem un conjunt d'estratègies pràctiques de mitigació per ajudar el futur treball.", 'bs': 'Najbolje uspostavljene metode prikupljanja podataka koje trenutno usvoje u NLP ovisi o sumpciji literatnosti govornika. Stoga, skupljena korpora u velikoj mjeri ne predstavlja zamjene globalnog stanovništva, koji su navodno neki od najranjivijih i marginaliziranijih ljudi u društvu, i često žive u ruralnim razvojnim područjima. Tako se takve nepreprezentatne grupe ne samo ignoriraju kada donose odluke o modelima i dizajnu sustava, nego također sprječavaju koristiti od rezultata razvoja postignute putem NLP podataka. Ovaj papir je cilj da se riješi nedostatak predstavljanja neznanih zajednica u korporaciji NLP-a: identificiramo potencijalne predrasude i etičke pitanja koje bi se mogle pojaviti kada skupljamo podatke iz ruralnih zajednica sa visokim stopama neznanja u zemljama niskog prihoda i predlažemo skup praktičnih strategija za smanjenje budućeg rada.', 'af': "Mees goed geïnstalleerde data versameling metodes wat huidiglik in NLP aangeneem is, afhang van die as- sumption van spreker literateit. Daarom het die versamele korpora groot misluk om swathes van die globaal bevolking te verteenwoordig, wat van sommige van die mees vulnerabele en marginaliseerde mense in samelewing te wees en dikwels in landboulike ontwikkelingsgebiede lewe. So ondersteunde groepe word dus nie slegs geïgnoreer wanneer modellering en stelsel ontwerp besluite maak, maar ook verhinder word van voordeel van ontwikkelingsoute wat deur data-gedrywe NLP bereik word nie. Hierdie papier is doel om die onderstelling van ongeleerde gemeenskappe in NLP-korpora te besluit: ons identifiseer potensiele voorskrifte en etiese aandag wat dalk kan voorkom wanneer data van landboulike gemeenskappe met hoë ongeleersaaklikheidstappe in Laag-Inkomste lande versamel word, en voorstel 'n stel praktiese gemeindiging strategies om toekomstige werk te help.", 'fi': 'Useimmat NLP:ssä nykyisin käytössä olevat vakiintuneet tiedonkeruumenetelmät riippuvat puhujien lukutaidosta. Näin ollen kerätyt corporat eivät suurelta osin edusta maailman väestönosia, jotka ovat yleensä yhteiskunnan haavoittuvimpia ja syrjäytyneimpiä ihmisiä ja asuvat usein maaseudun kehitysalueilla. Tällaiset aliedustetut ryhmät jäävät siis paitsi huomiotta mallinnuksen ja järjestelmäsuunnittelun päätöksenteossa, myös estetään hyötymästä datavetoisella NLP:llä saavutetuista kehitystuloksista. Tässä artikkelissa pyritään käsittelemään lukutaidottomien yhteisöjen aliedustusta NLP-korpusissa: tunnistamme mahdolliset ennakkoluulot ja eettiset kysymykset, joita saattaa syntyä kerätessämme tietoja maaseutuyhteisöiltä, joilla on korkea lukutaidottomuusaste pienituloisissa maissa, ja ehdotamme joukon käytännön hillitsemisstrategioita tulevaisuuden työn helpottamiseksi.', 'hy': 'Լավ հաստատված տվյալների հավաքածու մեթոդները, որոնք ներկայումս ընդունված են ՆԼՊ-ում, կախված են խոսնականի գրականության կողմից: Հետևաբար, հավաքված կառուցվածքները հիմնականում չեն կարողանում ներկայացնել համաշխարհային բնակչության շրջաններ, որոնք հակված են լինել հասարակության ամենախոցելի և առանձնացված մարդկանց մի մասը, և հաճախ ապրում են գյուղական զարգացող Այսպիսով, այս թերներկայացված խմբերը ոչ միայն անտեսվում են մոդելների և համակարգի դիզայնի որոշումների կայացման ժամանակ, այլ նաև արգելվում են շահույթ ստանալ զարգացման արդյունքներից, որոնք հասնում են տվյալների հիմնված ՆԼՊ-ի միջ Այս թղթին նպատակն է լուծել անգրավ համայնքների թերաներկայացումը ՆԼՊ-ի կորպորայում. մենք հայտնաբերում ենք պոտենցիալ կողմնականություններ և էթիկական խնդիրներ, որոնք կարող են առաջացնել գյուղական համայնքներից տվյալներ հավաքելու ժամանակ, երբ ցածր եկամուտ ունեցող երկրներում գրավականության բարձր մա', 'cs': 'Většina zavedených metod sběru dat v současnosti přijímaných v NLP závisí na výsledku gramotnosti mluvčích. V důsledku toho shromážděné korpusy do značné míry nepředstavují části světového obyvatelstva, které jsou obvykle jedními z nejzranitelnějších a marginalizovaných lidí ve společnosti a často žijí ve venkovských rozvojových oblastech. Takové nedostatečně zastoupené skupiny jsou proto ignorovány nejen při rozhodování o modelování a návrhu systému, ale také bráněny v tom, aby využívaly výsledků vývoje dosažených prostřednictvím datově řízené NLP. Tento článek si klade za cíl řešit nedostatečné zastoupení negramotných komunit v korpusech NLP: identifikujeme potenciální předsudky a etické problémy, které by mohly vzniknout při sběru dat z venkovských komunit s vysokou mírou negramotnosti v zemích s nízkými příjmy, a navrhujeme soubor praktických strategií zmírňování údajů, které pomohou budoucí práci.', 'et': 'Enamik praegu uues õppekavas kasutusele võetud hästi väljakujunenud andmekogumismeetodeid sõltub kõnelejate kirjaoskuse kokkuvõttest. Sellest tulenevalt ei esinda kogutud korpused suures osas maailma elanikkonna osa, kes kipuvad olema ühiskonna ühed haavatavamad ja marginaliseeritud inimesed ning elavad sageli maapiirkondades arenevates piirkondades. Selliseid alaesindatud rühmi ei ignoreerita seega mitte ainult modelleerimise ja süsteemi projekteerimise otsuste tegemisel, vaid ka ei saa kasutada andmepõhise uue tööprogrammi kaudu saavutatud arengutulemusi. Käesoleva dokumendi eesmärk on käsitleda kirjaoskamatute kogukondade alaesindatust uue tööprogrammi korpustes: tuvastame võimalikud eelarvamused ja eetilised küsimused, mis võivad tekkida andmete kogumisel maapiirkondadelt, kus kirjaoskamatuse määr on madala sissetulekuga riikides kõrge, ning pakume välja praktilised leevendusstrateegiad, et aidata kaasa tulevasele tööle.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Saboda haka, makampuni da aka samirta na kasancẽwa a tsakanin manyan jama'a duniya, wanda ke kamfata shi ne daga mafiya rauni da haske a cikin jamii, kuma ko da yawa sunã a cikin wurãren taƙaita. Don haka ba za'a ƙyale waɗannan jama'a waɗanda ba su nuna ba fãce idan sun sami tsarin masu motsi da tsarin na'ura, kuma amma ana kange su daga amfani da fassarar da aka samu a tsakanin NLP da aka danne shi. Wannan takardan na aimar ka address the undername of the illiterate populations in NLP Corp: tuna gane masu yiwuwa na hanyoyi da masu yiwuwa za su ci idan an sami data daga jamii ruura da za'a yi sauri da matsayi na akan littãfi a cikin Low-Income Countries, kuma munã buɗa wani set of mitandaki na yi amfani da aikin nan gaba.", 'sk': 'Večina uveljavljenih metod zbiranja podatkov, ki se trenutno uporabljajo v NLP, je odvisna od povzema pismenosti govornikov. Posledično zbrani korpusi v veliki meri ne predstavljajo delov svetovnega prebivalstva, ki so najbolj ranljivi in marginalizirani ljudje v družbi in pogosto živijo na podeželskih območjih v razvoju. Takšne premalo zastopane skupine se torej ne zanemarijo le pri sprejemanju odločitev o modeliranju in oblikovanju sistema, temveč tudi ne morejo izkoristiti koristi od razvojnih rezultatov, doseženih s podatkovno usmerjenim novim programom. Namen tega prispevka je obravnavati premalo zastopanost nepismenosti v korpusih NLP: ugotavljamo morebitne pristranskosti in etična vprašanja, ki se lahko pojavijo pri zbiranju podatkov iz podeželskih skupnosti z visoko stopnjo nepismenosti v državah z nizkimi dohodki, ter predlagamo niz praktičnih strategij za ublažitev prihodnjega dela.', 'jv': 'Awak dh챕w챕-Awak dh챕w챕 챕ntukno nggawe data nggawe ing NLP iki dadi luwih apik dh챕w챕- sumptaaken kuwi basa sing pirsak. Awak dh챕w챕, kab챔h wong-wong liya sing gak n챗m챗n wong liyane karo hal-wong sing gak b챗n챗d챗r gerakan kanggo wong liyane karo hal-wong liyane sing gak b챗n챗r terus karo hal-wong liyane, lan sak챕 durung urip gak n챗m챗n iki ning awak dh챕w챕 Grupo underrepresented dipunang챕 kuwi ora oleh nggawe nguasai model karo sistem design kejahatan, dadi apik nek ono ora bisa nguasai bener-ne dipunang챕 kapan sistem sing bisa dumadhi iki dadi NLP sampek. Perintah iki dadi nggawe ngupakan kelas-terakhi ning wong liyane karo perusahaan NLP: awake dh챕w챕 isih perusahaan karo perusahaan etik sing bisa nguasai nggawe data soti kapuwanan kapuwanan sing berarti segala macem kuwi dianggap ileterakhi dh챕w챕 ning dunya iki, lan supoyo akeh opera sing perusahaan podho nggawe nguasai perusahaan kuwi dianggap', 'bo': 'NLP ནང་དུ་བེད་སྤྲོད་ཡོད་པའི་ཆེས་སྒྲིག་ཆའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཡིན་པ་དང་མཉམ་སྤྲོད གཟུགས་བྱས་ན། མཉམ་བསྡོམས་པའི་སྡུད་ཁང་གིས་འཛམ་གླིང་མི་འབོར་རྣམས་ཀྱི་བར་སྟོན་པ་ཞིག་མི་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན། Such underrepresented groups are thus not only ignored when making modeling and system design decisions, but also prevented from benefiting from development outcomes achieved through data-driven NLP. ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་NLP ཚོགས་ཁང་ནང་གི་མི་རྣམས་གྲངས་མེད་པའི་ཚོགས་སྡེ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཞལ་འཛུགས་དུ་གཏོང་བཅུག་པ། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ནས་དབུལ', 'he': 'שיטות אוסף נתונים המבוססים ביותר כרגע מאושפות ב- NLP תלויות בסימום של ספרות הרמקולים. כתוצאה מכך, הקופורה המואספת בעיקר לא מייצגת חלקים של האוכלוסיה העולמית, אשר נוטה להיות חלק מהאנשים הכי פגיעים והמוגבלים בחברה, ולפעמים קרובות גרים באזור פיתוח כפרי. Such underrepresented groups are thus not only ignored when making modeling and system design decisions, but also prevented from benefiting from development outcomes achieved through data-driven NLP.  This paper aims to address the under-representation of illiterate communities in NLP corpora: we identify potential biases and ethical issues that might arise when collecting data from rural communities with high illiteracy rates in Low-Income Countries, and propose a set of practical mitigation strategies to help future work.'}
{'en': 'Content-based Models of Quotation', 'ar': 'نماذج الاقتباس القائمة على المحتوى', 'fr': 'Modèles de devis basés sur le contenu', 'pt': 'Modelos de cotação baseados em conteúdo', 'es': 'Modelos de cotización basados en el contenido', 'ja': 'コンテンツベースの見積もりモデル', 'zh': '其报价模形', 'hi': 'सामग्री-आधारित कोटेशन के मॉडल', 'ru': 'Модели ценовых предложений, основанные на содержании', 'ga': 'Samhlacha Luachana Bunaithe ar Ábhar', 'el': 'Μοντέλα προσφοράς βάσει περιεχομένου', 'hu': 'Tartalom alapú idézési modellek', 'kk': 'Мазмұны негіздеген квоттау үлгілері', 'lt': 'Citacijos modeliai, pagrįsti turiniu', 'it': 'Modelli di citazione basati sul contenuto', 'mk': 'Модели на цитирање базирани на содржина', 'ms': 'Model Quotasi Berasas Kandungan', 'ml': 'ഉള്ളടക്കത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ മോഡലുകള്\u200d', 'mn': 'Дүгнэлтийн үндсэн загвар', 'no': 'Innhaldsbaserte kvotasjonsmodeller', 'mt': 'Mudelli ta’ Kwotazzjoni bbażati fuq il-Kontenut', 'ka': 'Name', 'pl': 'Modele notowania oparte na treści', 'ro': 'Modele de cotare bazate pe conținut', 'sr': 'Modeli kvotacije na sadržaju', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Innehållsbaserade citatmodeller', 'ta': 'மேற்கோள் மாதிரிகளின் உள்ளடக்கம்', 'so': 'Isticmaalka aqoonsiga', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Taò¥rifi', 'vi': 'Truyền đơn chứa nội dung', 'da': 'Indholdsbaserede citatemodeller', 'nl': 'Op inhoud gebaseerde offertemodellen', 'hr': 'Modeli kvotacije na sadržaju', 'de': 'Inhaltsbasierte Angebotsmodelle', 'id': 'Content-based Models of Quotation', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای محتویات', 'ko': '내용 기반 견적 모델', 'bg': 'Основани на съдържанието модели на цитиране', 'tr': 'Görniş Opşenler:', 'sw': 'Modeli za Ufutaji', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Content-based Models of Quotation', 'az': 'M톛zmun-tabanl캼 Quotas캼 Modell톛ri', 'sq': 'Modele të përmbajtura', 'bn': 'বিষয়বস্তু ভিত্তিক মোডেল', 'ca': 'Models de citació basats en continguts', 'am': 'የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች', 'et': 'Sisupõhised tsiteerimismudelid', 'fi': 'Sisältöpohjaiset lainausmallit', 'bs': 'Modeli kvotacije na sadržaju', 'cs': 'Obsahové modely citací', 'jv': 'used', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'מודלים של ציטוט מבוססים בתוכן', 'sk': 'Vsebinski modeli citiranja', 'bo': 'གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་ནང་དོན་གཞི་བརྟེན་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས'}
{'en': 'We explore the task of quotability identification, in which, given a document, we aim to identify which of its passages are the most quotable, i.e. the most likely to be directly quoted by later derived documents. We approach quotability identification as a passage ranking problem and evaluate how well both feature-based and BERT-based (Devlin et al., 2019) models rank the passages in a given document by their predicted quotability. We explore this problem through evaluations on five datasets that span multiple languages (English, Latin) and genres of literature (e.g. poetry, plays, novels) and whose corresponding derived documents are of multiple types (news, journal articles). Our experiments confirm the relatively strong performance of BERT-based models on this task, with the best model, a RoBERTA sequential sentence tagger, achieving an average rho of 0.35 and NDCG@1, 5, 50 of 0.26, 0.31 and 0.40, respectively, across all five datasets.', 'ar': 'نحن نستكشف مهمة تحديد قابلية الاقتباس ، حيث نهدف ، في ضوء مستند ، إلى تحديد أي مقطع من مقاطعه يمكن اقتباسه ، أي الأكثر احتمالاً أن يتم اقتباسه مباشرة من خلال المستندات المشتقة لاحقًا. نحن نتعامل مع تحديد قابلية الاقتباس كمشكلة تصنيف مرور وتقييم مدى جودة كل من النماذج القائمة على الميزات والمستندة إلى BERT (Devlin et al. ، 2019) في ترتيب المقاطع في مستند معين من خلال قابلية اقتباسها المتوقعة. نستكشف هذه المشكلة من خلال التقييمات على خمس مجموعات بيانات تغطي لغات متعددة (الإنجليزية واللاتينية) وأنواع الأدب (مثل الشعر والمسرحيات والروايات) والمستندات المشتقة المقابلة لها من أنواع متعددة (الأخبار ، مقالات المجلات). تؤكد تجاربنا الأداء القوي نسبيًا للنماذج المستندة إلى BERT في هذه المهمة ، مع أفضل نموذج ، وهو أداة تمييز الجملة المتسلسلة RoBERTA ، مما يحقق متوسط قيمة rho 0.35 و NDCG @ 1 و 5 و 50 من 0.26 و 0.31 و 0.40 على التوالي ، عبر جميع مجموعات البيانات الخمس.', 'fr': "Nous explorons la tâche d'identification de la citabilité, dans laquelle, à partir d'un document, nous cherchons à identifier les passages les plus citables, c'est-à-dire les plus susceptibles d'être directement cités par des documents dérivés ultérieurs. Nous abordons l'identification de la quotabilité comme un problème de classement des passages et évaluons dans quelle mesure les modèles basés sur les caractéristiques et basés sur Bert (Devlin et al., 2019) classent les passages dans un document donné en fonction de leur quotabilité prévue. Nous explorons ce problème en évaluant cinq ensembles de données couvrant plusieurs langues (anglais, latin) et genres littéraires (par exemple, poésie, pièces de théâtre, romans) et dont les documents dérivés correspondants sont de multiples types (actualités, articles de revues). Nos expériences confirment les performances relativement élevées des modèles basés sur BERT sur cette tâche, avec le meilleur modèle, un tagger séquentiel de phrases Roberta, atteignant un rho moyen de 0,35 et NDCG @1, 5, 50 de 0,26, 0,31 et 0,40, respectivement, pour les cinq ensembles de données.", 'pt': 'Exploramos a tarefa de identificação de citabilidade, na qual, dado um documento, buscamos identificar quais de suas passagens são as mais citáveis, ou seja, as mais prováveis de serem diretamente citadas por documentos derivados posteriores. Abordamos a identificação de cotabilidade como um problema de classificação de passagens e avaliamos o quão bem os modelos baseados em recursos e os baseados em BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) classificam as passagens em um determinado documento por sua cotabilidade prevista. Exploramos esse problema por meio de avaliações em cinco conjuntos de dados que abrangem vários idiomas (inglês, latim) e gêneros de literatura (por exemplo, poesia, peças de teatro, romances) e cujos documentos derivados correspondentes são de vários tipos (notícias, artigos de periódicos). Nossos experimentos confirmam o desempenho relativamente forte dos modelos baseados em BERT nesta tarefa, com o melhor modelo, um marcador de sentença sequencial RoBERTA, alcançando um rho médio de 0,35 e NDCG@1, 5, 50 de 0,26, 0,31 e 0,40, respectivamente, em todos os cinco conjuntos de dados.', 'es': 'Exploramos la tarea de la identificación de la capacidad de cotización, en la que, dado un documento, pretendemos identificar cuáles de sus pasajes son los más citables, es decir, los que tienen más probabilidades de ser citados directamente en documentos derivados posteriores. Abordamos la identificación de la capacidad de cotización como un problema de clasificación de pasajes y evaluamos qué tan bien los modelos basados en características y basados en Bert (Devlin et al., 2019) clasifican los pasajes de un documento determinado según su cotización prevista. Exploramos este problema a través de evaluaciones en cinco conjuntos de datos que abarcan varios idiomas (inglés, latín) y géneros de la literatura (por ejemplo, poesía, obras de teatro, novelas) y cuyos documentos derivados correspondientes son de varios tipos (noticias, artículos de revistas). Nuestros experimentos confirman el rendimiento relativamente fuerte de los modelos basados en Bert en esta tarea, con el mejor modelo, un etiquetador de oraciones secuenciales RoBerta, que logra un rho promedio de 0.35 y NDCG @1, 5, 50 de 0.26, 0.31 y 0.40, respectivamente, en los cinco conjuntos de datos.', 'ja': '私たちは、引用性識別のタスクを探求します。このタスクでは、文書が与えられた場合、そのどの経路が最も引用可能であるか、すなわち、後に派生した文書によって直接引用される可能性が最も高いかを識別することを目指します。私たちは、引用性の同定をパッセージのランキング問題としてアプローチし、特徴ベースとBERTベースの両方のモデル（ Devlin et al., 2019 ）が、予測される引用性によって与えられた文書内のパッセージをどの程度うまくランク付けしているかを評価します。この問題は、複数の言語（英語、ラテン語）と文学のジャンル（詩、戯曲、小説など）にまたがり、対応する派生文書が複数のタイプ（ニュース、ジャーナル記事）である5つのデータセットに関する評価を通じて探求する。私たちの実験は、このタスクにおけるBERTベースのモデルの比較的強力なパフォーマンスを確認し、最良のモデル、RoBERTAシーケンシャル文章タグを使用して、5つのデータセットすべてにわたって、それぞれ0.35の平均RHOおよび0.26、0.31、および0.40の平均NDCG @ 1、5、50を達成します。', 'ru': 'Мы исследуем задачу идентификации котировки, в которой, учитывая документ, мы стремимся определить, какие из его отрывков являются наиболее цитируемыми, т.е. наиболее вероятно, что они будут непосредственно цитироваться в более поздних производных документах. Мы подходим к определению котировки как к проблеме ранжирования пассажей и оцениваем, насколько хорошо как функциональные, так и BERT-модели (Devlin et al., 2019) ранжируют пассажи в данном документе по их прогнозируемой котировке. Мы изучаем эту проблему путем оценки пяти наборов данных, которые охватывают несколько языков (английский, латинский) и жанров литературы (например, поэзия, пьесы, романы) и соответствующие производные документы которых имеют несколько типов (новости, статьи в журналах). Наши эксперименты подтверждают относительно высокую производительность моделей на основе BERT по этой задаче, с лучшей моделью, тегером последовательных предложений RoBERTA, достигая среднего значения rho 0,35 и NDCG при1, 5, 50 0,26, 0,31 и 0,40, соответственно, во всех пяти наборах данных.', 'zh': '我们探索了引用性识的务务,其中,给定一个文档,我们的是定何段落最易引用,即最有可以被后来衍生文件直引用。 吾将引性识以为段落名,而评其特徵与BERT之(Devlin等,2019)依其占引用性对给定文档之段落而名之。 余因越多种语言(英语,引丁语)与文学(如诗戏剧,小说)五集之评以究之,且衍生文档属多种类型(新闻,期刊文)。 吾实验证BERT于此者为能,莫若RoBERTA次句识器,五数各得其0.35 NDCG@1之均rho,5,50之0.26,0.310.40。', 'hi': 'हम उद्धरण क्षमता पहचान के कार्य का पता लगाते हैं, जिसमें, एक दस्तावेज़ को देखते हुए, हम यह पहचानने का लक्ष्य रखते हैं कि इसके कौन से मार्ग सबसे अधिक उद्धृत करने योग्य हैं, यानी बाद में व्युत्पन्न दस्तावेजों द्वारा सीधे उद्धृत किए जाने की सबसे अधिक संभावना है। हम एक मार्ग रैंकिंग समस्या के रूप में उद्धरण पहचान का दृष्टिकोण करते हैं और मूल्यांकन करते हैं कि सुविधा-आधारित और BERT-आधारित (Devlin et al., 2019) मॉडल कितनी अच्छी तरह से किसी दिए गए दस्तावेज़ में मार्गों को उनकी अनुमानित उद्धरण क्षमता से रैंक करते हैं। हम पांच डेटासेट पर मूल्यांकन के माध्यम से इस समस्या का पता लगाते हैं जो कई भाषाओं (अंग्रेजी, लैटिन) और साहित्य की शैलियों (जैसे कविता, नाटक, उपन्यास) को फैलाते हैं और जिनके संबंधित व्युत्पन्न दस्तावेज कई प्रकार के हैं (समाचार, पत्रिका लेख)। हमारे प्रयोगइस कार्य पर BERT-आधारित मॉडल के अपेक्षाकृत मजबूत प्रदर्शन की पुष्टि करते हैं, सबसे अच्छा मॉडल, एक RoBERTA अनुक्रमिक वाक्य टैगर के साथ, 0.35 और NDCG@1 का औसत rho प्राप्त करते हुए, 5, 50 के 0.26, 0.31 और 0.40, क्रमशः, सभी पांच डेटासेट में।', 'ga': 'Déanaimid iniúchadh ar an tasc a bhaineann le haithint inquotability, ina bhfuil sé mar aidhm againn, i ndoiciméad, a aithint cé acu de na sleachta is luaití a bheidh ann, i.e. na cinn is dóichí a luafar go díreach i ndoiciméid díorthaithe níos déanaí. Déileálaimid le sainaithint luachana mar fhadhb rangú pasáiste agus déanaimid measúnú ar cé chomh maith agus atá samhlacha atá bunaithe ar ghné agus bunaithe ar BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) i rangú na sleachta i ndoiciméad ar leith de réir a n-infhiúntacht tuartha. Déanaimid iniúchadh ar an bhfadhb seo trí mheasúnuithe a dhéanamh ar chúig thacar sonraí a chuimsíonn teangacha iolracha (Béarla, Laidin) agus seánraí litríochta (m.sh. filíocht, drámaí, úrscéalta) agus a bhfuil a ndoiciméid díorthaithe comhfhreagracha de chineálacha iolracha (nuacht, ailt irisleabhair). Deimhníonn ár dturgnaimh feidhmíocht sách láidir samhlacha bunaithe ar BERT ar an tasc seo, agus an tsamhail is fearr, clibeálaí abairte seicheamhach RoBERTA, ag baint amach meán rho de 0.35 agus NDCG@1, 5, 50 de 0.26, 0.31 agus 0.40, faoi seach, thar na cúig thacar sonraí go léir.', 'hu': 'Feltárjuk az idézhetőség azonosításának feladatát, amelyben egy dokumentum alapján arra törekszünk, hogy meghatározzuk, melyik része a leginkább idézhető, azaz a legvalószínűbb, hogy a későbbi származtatott dokumentumok közvetlenül idézhető. Az idézhetőség azonosítását átmeneti rangsorolási problémaként közelítjük meg, és értékeljük, hogy mind a funkcióalapú, mind a BERT alapú modellek (Devlin et al., 2019) mennyire jól rangsorolják egy adott dokumentumban a várható idézhetőségük alapján. Ezt a problémát öt olyan adathalmaz értékelésével vizsgáljuk fel, amelyek több nyelven (angol, latin) és irodalmi műfajokon (pl. költészet, darabok, regények), és amelyeknek megfelelő származtatott dokumentumai többféle típusú (hírek, folyóiratok). Kísérleteink megerősítik a BERT alapú modellek viszonylag erős teljesítményét ebben a feladatban, a legjobb modell, a RoBERTA szekvenciális mondatcímkéző, amely átlagos rho 0,35 és NDCG@1 5, 50 0,26, 0,31 és 0,40 mind az öt adatkészletben.', 'el': 'Διερευνούμε το καθήκον της ταυτοποίησης της αναφοριμότητας, στο οποίο, δεδομένης ενός εγγράφου, επιδιώκουμε να προσδιορίσουμε ποια από τα αποσπάσματα του είναι τα πλέον αναφερόμενα, δηλαδή τα πιο πιθανά να αναφερθούν άμεσα από μεταγενέστερα παράγωγα έγγραφα. Προσεγγίζουμε τον προσδιορισμό της ποσόστωσης ως πρόβλημα κατάταξης διαβατηρίων και αξιολογούμε πόσο καλά τόσο τα μοντέλα που βασίζονται σε χαρακτηριστικά όσο και τα μοντέλα που βασίζονται σε BERT (κ.α., 2019) κατατάσσουν τα αποσπάσματα σε ένα δεδομένο έγγραφο βάσει της προβλεπόμενης ποσόστωσης τους. Εξετάζουμε το πρόβλημα αυτό μέσω αξιολογήσεων σε πέντε σύνολα δεδομένων που καλύπτουν πολλές γλώσσες (αγγλικά, λατινικά) και είδη λογοτεχνίας (π.χ. ποίηση, θεατρικά έργα, μυθιστορήματα) και των οποίων τα αντίστοιχα παράγωγα έγγραφα είναι πολλαπλών τύπων (ειδήσεις, άρθρα περιοδικών). Τα πειράματά μας επιβεβαιώνουν τη σχετικά ισχυρή απόδοση των μοντέλων που βασίζονται στο BERT σε αυτό το έργο, με το καλύτερο μοντέλο, έναν διαδοχικό δείκτη προτάσεων RoBERTA, επιτυγχάνοντας ένα μέσο όρο των 0.35 και NDCG@1 5, 50 από 0.26, 0.31 και 0.40 αντίστοιχα, και στα πέντε σύνολα δεδομένων.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ კოტაბულობის ინდენტიფიკაციის დავაკვირდებით, რომელიც კოკუტაბულობის ინდენტიფიკაცია, რომელიც დავაკვირდებით, ჩვენ მინდა იდენტიფიკაცია, რომელიც მისი სინამდვილეში უფრო კოტაბულია,  ჩვენ კოტაბულობის ინდენტიფიკაციას მივიღეთ როგორც პრობლემენტის პრობლემენტის პრობლემენტის განსაზღვრება და განსაზღვრება, როგორც განსაზღვრებული კოტაბულობის განსაზღვრება და BERT-ის განსაზღვრება ჩვენ ამის პრობლემა გავაკეთებთ ხუთი მონაცემების განსაზღვრებით, რომლებიც მრავალ ენები (ანგლისური, ლატინური) და ლეტებერიის გენერები (მაგალითად, ოჲეზია, თამაში, პრომენტებით) და რომლებიც შემ ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები დარწმუნდება BERT-ის მოდელების პარამეტრებით ძალიან გამოსახულება ამ რაოდენზე, ყველაზე საუკეთესო მოდელეში, რობერტა სექსენტიული სიტყვების მაგრამა, რომელიც NDCG@1 , 5, 50 0, 26, 0, 31 და 0, 40, შესახებ, ყველა 5 მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში.', 'it': "Esaminiamo il compito di identificazione della quotabilità, in cui, dato un documento, miriamo a identificare quali dei suoi passaggi sono i più quotati, cioè i più probabili da essere direttamente citati da documenti derivati successivamente. Approfondiamo l'identificazione della quotabilità come un problema di classificazione dei passaggi e valutiamo quanto bene sia i modelli basati su funzionalità che su BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) classifichino i passaggi in un dato documento in base alla loro quotabilità prevista. Esploriamo questo problema attraverso valutazioni su cinque set di dati che coprono più lingue (inglese, latino) e generi letterari (ad esempio poesia, opere teatrali, romanzi) e i cui corrispondenti documenti derivati sono di più tipi (notizie, articoli di giornale). I nostri esperimenti confermano le prestazioni relativamente forti dei modelli basati su BERT su questo compito, con il modello migliore, un marcatore di frasi sequenziale RoBERTA, raggiungendo un rho medio di 0,35 e NDCG@1 5, 50 di 0,26, 0,31 e 0,40, rispettivamente, in tutti e cinque i set di dati.", 'lt': 'Mes i šnagrinėjame kvotų nustatymo užduotį, kurioje, atsižvelgiant į dokumentą, siekiame nustatyti, kurios iš jo dalių yra labiausiai kvotuojamos, t. y. labiausiai tikėtina, kad bus tiesiogiai cituojamos vėlesniais išvestiniais dokumentais. Kalbame apie kvotavimo nustatymą kaip keleivių klasifikavimo problem ą ir vertiname, kaip ir pagal savybes pagrįsti, ir pagal BERT (Devlin et al., 2019 m.), modeliai pagal numatomą kvotavimą klasifikuoja tam tikro dokumento dalis. Šią problem ą ištiriame atlikdami penkių duomenų rinkinių, apimančių daugelį kalbų (anglų, lotynų) ir literatūros genrų (pvz., poeziją, žaidimus, romanus), kurių atitinkami parengti dokumentai yra įvairių tipų (naujienos, žurnalo straipsniai), vertinimus. Mūsų eksperimentai patvirtina santykinai stiprų BERT pagrįstų modelių veiksmingumą šioje užduotyje, naudojant geriausią model į, RoBERTA sekacinį sakinio žymenį, kurio vidutinis rho yra 0,35 ir NDCG@1 , 5, 50 atitinkamai 0,26, 0,31 ir 0,40 visų penkių duomenų rinkinių.', 'kk': 'Біз көбейтілік идентификациясының тапсырмасын зерттеп көрдік. Бұл құжатта келтірілген құжаттардың қайсының көбейтілігін анықтау мақсатымыз, яғни кейінгі құжаттардың көмектесілігін көр Біз квоталықтың идентификациясын пайдалану жолдарының мәселесі ретінде келеді және BERT- негіздеген (Devlin et al., 2019) үлгілерін қанша жақсы бағалау үлгілерін бағалаймыз. Біз бұл мәселеді бірнеше тілді (ағылшын, латын) және литератураның жанрлары (мысалы, поэтрия, ойындар, романдар) және оның сәйкес келген құжаттарды бірнеше түрлері (жаңалық, күнделік мақалалары) баға Біздің тәжірибеміздің BERT негіздеген үлгілердің салыстырмалы ықтималдығын тексеру үшін, ең жақсы үлгілеріміз бар, RoBERTA келесі мәліметтің тегжері, 0,35 ретінде орташа ро және NDCG@1 , 5, 50 - 0, 26, 0, 31 және 0, 40 - барлық бес деректер жиындарында.', 'ms': 'Kami mengeksplorasi tugas pengenalan kuatabilitas, di mana, diberikan dokumen, kami bertujuan untuk mengenalpasti mana dari laluan yang paling boleh dikutut, iaitu yang paling mungkin akan dikutut secara langsung oleh dokumen berasal kemudian. Kami mendekati pengenalan kuatabilitas sebagai masalah penataran laluan dan menilai betapa baik kedua-dua model berdasarkan fitur dan berdasarkan BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) menandakan laluan dalam dokumen tertentu oleh kuatabilitas yang dijangka. Kami mengeksplorasi masalah ini melalui penilaian pada lima set data yang meliputi berbagai bahasa (Bahasa Inggeris, Latin) dan jenis sastra (misalnya puisi, permainan, novel) dan yang dokumen berasal yang sepadan adalah jenis berbilang (berita, artikel jurnal). Eksperimen kami mengesahkan prestasi relatif kuat dari model berasaskan BERT pada tugas ini, dengan model terbaik, tag kalimat sekwensial RoBERTA, mencapai rho rata-rata 0.35 dan NDCG@1 , 5, 50 dari 0.26, 0.31 dan 0.40, berdasarkan semua lima set data.', 'mk': 'Ја истражуваме задачата за идентификација на квитабилноста, во која, со оглед на документот, имаме за цел да идентификуваме кој од нејзините премини е најквитабилен, односно најверојатно да биде директно цитиран од подоцна изведени документи. Ние се приближуваме до идентификацијата на квитабилноста како проблем со рангирањето на премините и проценуваме колку добро моделите базирани на карактеристики и на БЕРТ (Devlin et al., 2019) ги рангираат премините во одреден документ според нивната предвидена квитабилност. Го истражуваме овој проблем преку евалуации на пет податоци кои ги опфаќаат повеќето јазици (англиски, латински) и генери на литературата (на пример поезија, претстави, романи) и чии соодветни изведени документи се од повеќето видови (вести, весници). Нашите експерименти ја потврдуваат релативно силната перформанса на моделите базирани на БЕРТ на оваа задача, со најдобриот модел, секвенцијален реченицен означувач РоБЕРТА, достигнувајќи просечен роу од 0,35 и NDCG@1 , 5, 50 од 0,26, 0,31 и 0,40, односно, во сите пет податоци.', 'ml': 'We explore the task of quotability identification, in which, given a document, we aim to identify which of its passages are the most quotable, i.e. the most likely to be directly quoted by later derived documents.  നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പാസ്സേജ് റാങ്ങിങ് പ്രശ്നമായി സ്ഥാപിക്കുന്ന പ്രശ്നമായി സ്ഥാപിക്കുന്ന പ്രശ്നങ്ങളായി അടുത്തുചെല്ലുന്നു. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച രേഖയില്\u200d  അഞ്ച് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലൂടെ നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെ പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. അത് പല ഭാഷകളും (ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്, ലാറ്റിന്\u200d, ലാത്തിന്\u200d) സാഹിത്യത്തിന്റെയും ജന്തുക്കളുടെയും (ഉദാഹരണമായ കവ നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d ബെര്\u200dട്ടി അടിസ്ഥാനമായ മോഡലുകളുടെ ശക്തിയുള്ള പ്രകടനത്തെ ഉറപ്പിക്കുന്നു, ഏറ്റവും നല്ല മോഡല്\u200d, റോബെര്\u200dട്ടാറ്റ, പിന NDCG@1 0.26, 0.31, 0.40, എല്ലാ അഞ്ച് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലും 5, 50.', 'mt': 'Aħna nesploraw il-kompitu tal-identifikazzjoni tal-kwotabbiltà, li fih, meta ngħata dokument, nimmiraw li nidentifikaw liema mill-passiġġi tiegħu huma l-aktar kwotabbli, jiġifieri l-aktar probabbli li jiġu kkwotati direttament minn dokumenti derivati aktar tard. Aħna nindirizzaw l-identifikazzjoni tal-kwotabbiltà bħal a problema tal-klassifikazzjoni tal-passiġġieri u jivvalutaw kemm il-mudelli bbażati fuq karatteristiċi kif ukoll fuq BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) jikklassifikaw il-passiġġieri f’dokument partikolari skont il-kwotabbiltà mbassra tagħhom. Aħna nesploraw din il-problema permezz ta’ evalwazzjonijiet fuq ħames settijiet ta’ dejta li jkopru diversi lingwi (Ingliż, Latin) u ġeneri ta’ letteratura (pereżempju poeżija, logħob, romanzi) u li d-dokumenti derivati korrispondenti tagħhom huma ta’ diversi tipi (aħbarijiet, artikoli tal-ġurnal). L-esperimenti tagħna jikkonfermaw il-prestazzjoni relattivament qawwija ta’ mudelli bbażati fuq BERT fuq dan il-kompitu, bl-a ħjar mudell, tagger sekwenzjali tas-sentenza RoBERTA, li jikseb rho medja ta’ 0.35 u NDCG@1 , 5, 50 ta’ 0.26, 0.31 u 0.40, rispettivament, fil-ħames settijiet ta’ dejta kollha.', 'no': 'Vi undersøker oppgåva for identifikasjon av kvotabelitet, der vi har gitt eit dokument, må identifisera kva av passagene sine er den mest kvotabelitet, dvs. den mest sannsynleg som vert direkte sitert av seinare avhengige dokument. Vi tilnærmer kvatabilitetsidentifikasjonen som eit problem med passasjon og evaluerer kor godt både funksjonsbaserte og BERT-baserte modeller (Devlin et al., 2019) rankerer passasjonane i eit oppgitt dokument med forventa kvotabilitet. Vi undersøker dette problemet gjennom evalueringar på fem datasett som utvidar fleire språk (engelsk, latin) og gener av litteratur (f.eks. poesie, spelar, romanar) og kva tilsvarande utvikla dokument er av fleire typar (nyhetar, dagbokartiklar). Eksperimentane våre stadfestar relativt sterke utviklinga av BERT-baserte modeller på denne oppgåva, med den beste modellen, eit RoBERTA-tagger med følgjande setningar, som gjennomsnittlig rho av 0,35 og NDCG@1 , 5, 50 av 0, 26, 0, 31 og 0, 40 på alle fem datasett.', 'ro': 'Explorăm sarcina identificării cotabilității, în care, dată fiind un document, ne propunem să identificăm care dintre pasajele sale sunt cele mai cotabile, adică cele mai probabil să fie citate direct de documentele derivate ulterior. Abordăm identificarea cotabilității ca o problemă de rangare a pasajelor și evaluăm cât de bine atât modelele bazate pe caracteristici, cât și modelele bazate pe BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) clasifică pasajele dintr-un anumit document după cotabilitatea lor anticipată. Explorăm această problemă prin evaluări pe cinci seturi de date care cuprind mai multe limbi (engleză, latină) și genuri de literatură (de exemplu poezie, piese de teatru, romane) și ale căror documente derivate corespunzătoare sunt de mai multe tipuri (știri, articole de revistă). Experimentele noastre confirmă performanța relativ puternică a modelelor bazate pe BERT pe această sarcină, cu cel mai bun model, un etichetor secvențial RoBERTA, obținând un rho mediu de 0,35 și NDCG@1 5, 50 din 0,26, 0,31 și respectiv 0,40, pentru toate cele cinci seturi de date.', 'pl': 'Analizujemy zadanie identyfikacji cytowalności, w której dany dokument ma na celu określenie, które z jego fragmentów są najbardziej cytowalne, czyli najbardziej prawdopodobne, że będą bezpośrednio cytowane przez późniejsze dokumenty pochodne. Podejmujemy identyfikację cytowalności jako problem rankingu pasażerów i oceniamy, jak dobrze zarówno modele funkcjonalne, jak i BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) klasyfikują fragmenty w danym dokumencie według ich przewidywanej cytowalności. Badamy ten problem poprzez oceny pięciu zbiorów danych, które obejmują wiele języków (angielski, łaciński) i gatunków literatury (np. poezja, sztuki, powieści) i których odpowiadające im dokumenty pochodne są wielu typów (wiadomości, artykuły czasopismowe). Nasze eksperymenty potwierdzają stosunkowo silną wydajność modeli opartych na BERT w tym zadaniu, z najlepszym modelem, sekwencyjnym tagerem zdań RoBERTA, osiągającym średnią rho 0,35 i NDCG@1 odpowiednio 5, 50 z 0.26, 0.31 i 0.40 we wszystkich pięciu zbiorach danych.', 'mn': 'Бид хэлбэрийн тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолтын даалгаварыг судалж, үүнийг баримт өгсөн бөгөөд бид түүний даалгавруудын хамгийн ихэнх тодорхойлолтын тухай тодорхойлох зорилго олгодог. Бид хувилбарын тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолтын асуудал болж, харин өөрчлөлт дээр суурилсан болон BERT-д суурилсан (Devlin et al., 2019) загварууд нь тодорхойлогдсон баримт дахь загваруудыг хэр сайн тодорхойлдог вэ? Бид энэ асуудлыг олон хэл (Англи, Латин) болон уран зохиолын жинхэнэ (жишээ нь шүлэг, тоглоомууд, зохиолууд), таван өгөгдлийн сангийн оюутнуудыг судалж байна. Бидний туршилтууд энэ ажил дээр BERT-ийн загварын харьцангуй хүчтэй үйлдэлийг баталж байна. Хамгийн сайн загвартай, RoBERTA-ын дараагийн өгүүлбэр тэмдэглэгч, дундаж ро 0.35 болон NDCG@1 0.26, 0.31, 0.40 бүх таван өгөгдлийн сангуудын 5, 50.', 'so': 'Shaqada aqoonsiga aqoonsiga ayaannu baaraynaa, kaas oo aan ku qornay dukumenti, waxaynu ku talo galaynaa inaannu aqoonsanno qofka baasabooridiisa ugu qiimo badan, taas oo ah kuwa ugu macquul in toos looga quriso dukumentiyada soo socday. Waxaynu u soo dhowaynaa aqoonsiga aqoonsiga oo ah dhibaatada baaxada ee baaxada, waxaana qiimeynaynaa sidoo kale qaababka ku saleysan iyo qaabka BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) ee baasaboorada ku qoran warqada la qoray oo ay ku qoran aqoonsigooda. Waxaannu dhibaatadan ku baaraynaa qiimeynta shanta macluumaad oo ku qoran luuqado kala duduwan (Ingiriis, Latin) iyo heerar sawir ah (tusaale ahaan shahaado, ciyaaraha, riwaayadaha) iyo warqadaha ku habboon ay yihiin noocyo kala duduwan (warqado, warqado). Imtixaankayada ayaa ku xaqiijinaya sameynta qaababka ku saleysan BERT, tusaale ahaan ugu fiican ee RoBERTA waxey gaadhaan qiyaastii ugu dhexeeya 0.35 iyo NDCG@1 , 5, 50 0.26, 0.31 iyo 0.40, dhammaan shanta sawirada oo dhan.', 'sr': 'Istražujemo zadatak identifikacije kvotabilnosti, u kojem smo, s obzirom na dokument, ciljali da identifikujemo koji je od njegovih prolaza najkvotabilniji, tj. najverovatnije će biti direktno citirani kasnije izvedenim dokumentima. Približavamo identifikaciji kvotabilnosti kao problem u redovima prolaza i procjenjujemo kako dobro i modeli na osnovu funkcija i na osnovu BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) rankuju prolaze u određenom dokumentu njihovim predviđenim kvotabilnošću. Istražujemo ovaj problem putem procjene na pet podataka koji šire više jezika (engleski, latinski) i genre literature (npr. poezije, igra, romane) i čiji odgovarajući izvedeni dokumenti su od višestrukih vrsta (vesti, dnevni članovi). Naši eksperimenti potvrđuju relativno jaku provedbu model a na BERT-u na ovom zadatku, sa najboljim modelom, označiteljem rečenica RoBERTA, postižeći prosječni roh od 0,35 i NDCG@1 5, 50 od 0,26, 0,31 i 0,40, u svih pet podataka.', 'sv': 'Vi undersöker uppgiften att identifiera citabilitet, där vi, med tanke på ett dokument, strävar efter att identifiera vilka av dess avsnitt som är mest citerbara, dvs. de som mest sannolikt kommer att citeras direkt av senare härledda dokument. Vi närmar oss kvoteringsidentifiering som ett passagerankingsproblem och utvärderar hur väl både funktionsbaserade och BERT-baserade modeller (Devlin et al., 2019) rankar passagerna i ett givet dokument utifrån deras förutspådda kvoteringsgrad. Vi undersöker detta problem genom utvärderingar på fem datauppsättningar som spänner över flera språk (engelska, latin) och litteraturgenrer (t.ex. poesi, pjäser, romaner) och vars motsvarande härledda dokument är av flera typer (nyheter, tidskriftsartiklar). Våra experiment bekräftar den relativt starka prestandan hos BERT-baserade modeller på denna uppgift, med den bästa modellen, en RoBERTA sekventiell meningsmärkning, som uppnår en genomsnittlig rho på 0,35 och NDCG@1 5, 50 av 0,26, 0,31 respektive 0,40 för alla fem datauppsättningar.', 'si': 'අපි කෝටැබිලි පරීක්ෂණය ගැන වැඩක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, ඒ වලින්, ලිපිණියක් දීලා තියෙනවා, අපි අදහස් කරනවා එයාගේ පාස් වලින් කවුද කෝටේබල් වල අපි කෝටැබිලිටි පරීක්ෂණයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙ අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ දත්ත සේට් පහක් වලින් විශ්වාස කරන්න, ඒ වගේම වඩා භාෂාව (ඉංග්\u200dරීසි, ලැටින්) සහ සාධාරණාවක් වලින් (ය අපේ පරීක්ෂණය සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරනවා BERT-ආධාරිත මොඩේල් එකේ සාමාන්\u200dය ශක්තිමත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, හොඳම මොඩේල් එක්ක, RoBERTA සාමාන්\u200dය වාක NDCG@1 , 5, 50 of 0.26, 0.31 and 0.40, as a percentage, all five data sets.', 'ta': 'We explore the task of quotability identification, in which, given a document, we aim to identify which of its passages are the most quotable, i.e. the most likely to be directly quoted by later derived documents.  நாம் கூட்டுக்கொடுக்கும் அடையாளத்தை கடவுச் சிக்கல் பிரச்சனையாக முன்னோக்குகிறோம் மற்றும் BERT-அடிப்படையில் இருந்தும் (டெப்லின் et al., 2019) மா இந்த பிரச்சனையை நாம் பல மொழிகள் (ஆங்கிலத்தில், லத்தீன்) மற்றும் இலக்கத்தின் மரங்கள் (உதாரணமாக கவிதி, விளையாடுகிறார்கள், குறிப்புகள்) மற்றும் அணு தரவுத்தளங்களில் பிரச் இந்த செயல்பாட்டில் BERT-அடிப்படையான மாதிரிகளின் சிறந்த மாதிரியை நம்முடைய சோதனைகளை உறுதி செய்கிறது, ஒரு ரோப்பர்டா பின்வரும் வாக்கு குறிப்பாக் NDCG@1 0.26, 0.31 மற்றும் 0.40, ஒவ்வொரு ஐந்து தரவு அமைப்புகளுக்கும் முழுவதும்.', 'ur': 'ہم کوٹیبلیٹی شناسایی کے کام کا تحقیق کرتے ہیں، جہاں، ایک سند دی گئی ہے، ہم اس کے مسافروں میں سے کس کا مقصد پہچان کرنا چاہتے ہیں، یعنی اس کے سب سے زیادہ قابل ہے، یعنی اس سے زیادہ احتمال ہے کہ بعدا معلوم ہونے والی سند کے ذریعہ مستقیم اشار ہم کوٹیبلیٹ کی شناسایی کو ایک مسئلہ رینگ مسئلہ کی طرح پہنچا رہے ہیں اور ان کی پیش بینی کوٹیبلیٹ کے ذریعہ ان کے فائدے اور BERT-based (Devlin et al., 2019) موڈلوں کو کس طرح طرح طرح کے مطابق مقرر کر رہے ہیں۔ ہم اس مسئلہ کو پانچ ڈاٹ سٹ کے مطابق تحقیقات کے ذریعہ تحقیق کرتے ہیں جو بہت سی زبانیں (انگلیسی، لاتین) اور ادبیات کی جنریں (جیسے شعر، کھیل، روزنامہ) اور ان کے مطابق پیدا ہوئے دلیلیں بہت سی طرح ہیں (اخبار، جرنل کے مع ہماری آزمائش اس کام پر BERT-based موڈل کی نسبتا مضبوط عملکرد کی تصدیق کرتی ہے، بہترین موڈل کے ساتھ، ایک روBERTA سفارشی فیصلہ ٹاگر، 0.35 کے متوسط رئو تک پہنچ رہی ہے اور NDCG@1 ، 5، 50، 0.26، 0.31 اور 0.40، ہر پانچ ڈیٹسٹ میں۔', 'uz': "We explore the task of quotability identification, in which, given a document, we aim to identify which of its passages are the most quotable, i.e. the most likely to be directly quoted by later derived documents.  Biz quyidagi pochta shaxsiyatlarni koʻpaytirish muammolari sifatida qiymatimiz va xususiyatlarning asosida va BERT asosida (Devlin et al., 2019) modellarini koʻrsatilgan hujjatda maxfiy soʻzlarni qidirish mumkin. Biz bu muammolarni bir necha tillar (Ingliz, Latin) va litteratorining genlari (m.eks. poiz, o'ynash, novellar) bilan qiymatimiz va ularning qiymatiga ega hujjatlari bir nechta turlari (news, joriy maqolalar). Bizning imtiyozlarimiz bu vazifaning asosiy BERT modellarining qisqarli sterk bajarishini ishlatiladi, eng yaxshi modeli bilan, RoBERTA keyingi soʻzlar tagga keladi, 0.35 va 0.35 dan o'rtacha o'tkazda NDCG@1 0.26, 0.31 va 0.40 bilan barcha 5 maʼlumotlar tarkibida.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi khám phá nhiệm vụ xác định dấu hiệu khả năng ước lượng, trong đó, dựa trên một tài liệu, chúng tôi muốn xác định các đoạn nào là dễ trích dẫn nhất, tức là những đoạn có khả năng được trích dẫn trực tiếp từ các tài liệu sau. Chúng tôi tiếp cận khả năng xác định định định định định khả năng chia hàng như một vấn đề cấp đoạn và đánh giá khả năng chia đều được dựa trên tính năng hoạt động của hoạt động. Chúng tôi nghiên cứu vấn đề này qua đánh giá trên năm bộ dữ liệu bao g ồm nhiều ngôn ngữ (Anh, Latin) và các loại văn học (v. d. thi ca, vở kịch, tiểu thuyết) và những tài liệu thu theo tương ứng có nhiều loại (tin tức, tạp chí). Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi xác nhận hiệu quả tương đối mạnh của các mô- đun BERT dựa vào nhiệm vụ này, với mô hình tốt nhất, ghi chú dòng dõi Roenguyền và đạt được một năm trung bình của 0.35 và NDCG@1 , năm, 50 of 0.26, 0.31 và 0.40, gồm cả năm tập tin.', 'bg': 'Изследваме задачата за идентификация на цитатимостта, в която при даден документ се стремим да идентифицираме кои от пасажите му са най-цитирани, т.е. най-вероятно е пряко цитирани от по-късните извлечени документи. Ние подхождаме към идентифицирането на квотабилността като проблем с класирането на пасажите и оценяваме колко добре както базираните на характеристики, така и базираните на BERT модели (Девлин и др., 2019) класират пасажите в даден документ по прогнозната им квотабилност. Проучваме този проблем чрез оценки на пет набора от данни, които обхващат множество езици (английски, латински) и жанрове на литературата (например поезия, пиеси, романи) и чиито съответни извлечени документи са от множество типове (новини, статии от списания). Нашите експерименти потвърждават относително силната производителност на базираните на тази задача модели, като най-добрият модел, последователен тагер на изречения постига средно 0,35 и NDCG@1 5, 50 от 0, 26, 0, 31 и 0, 40 съответно във всички пет набора данни.', 'nl': 'We onderzoeken de taak van citeerbaarheid identificatie, waarbij we, gegeven aan een document, proberen te bepalen welke passages het meest citeerbaar zijn, d.w.z. de meest waarschijnlijke direct geciteerd worden door latere afgeleide documenten. We benaderen quotabiliteitsidentificatie als een passage ranking probleem en evalueren hoe goed zowel feature-based als BERT-based (Devlin et al., 2019) modellen de passages in een bepaald document rangschikken op basis van hun voorspelde quotabiliteit. We onderzoeken dit probleem door middel van evaluaties op vijf datasets die meerdere talen (Engels, Latijn) en genres van literatuur (bijvoorbeeld poëzie, toneelstukken, romans) bestrijken en waarvan de bijbehorende afgeleide documenten van meerdere soorten zijn (nieuws, tijdschriftartikelen). Onze experimenten bevestigen de relatief sterke prestaties van BERT-gebaseerde modellen op deze taak, met het beste model, een RoBERTA sequentiële zin tagger, het bereiken van een gemiddelde rho van 0,35 en NDCG@1 5, 50 of 0.26, 0.31 en 0.40, respectievelijk voor alle vijf datasets.', 'da': 'Vi undersøger opgaven med identifikation af kvotabilitet, hvor vi på baggrund af et dokument søger at identificere, hvilke af dets passager der er mest citerbare, dvs. de mest sandsynlige, der direkte vil blive citeret af senere afledte dokumenter. Vi nærmer os kvotability identifikation som et passagerrangeringsproblem og vurderer, hvor godt både funktionsbaserede og BERT-baserede modeller (Devlin et al., 2019) rangerer passagererne i et givet dokument efter deres forudsigede kvotability. Vi undersøger dette problem gennem evalueringer på fem datasæt, der spænder over flere sprog (engelsk, latin) og litteraturgenrer (f.eks. poesi, skuespil, romaner), og hvis tilsvarende afledte dokumenter er af flere typer (nyheder, tidsskriftsartikler). Vores eksperimenter bekræfter den relativt stærke ydeevne af BERT-baserede modeller på denne opgave, med den bedste model, en RoBERTA sekventiel sætning tagger, der opnår et gennemsnitligt rho på 0,35 og NDCG@1 5, 50 af henholdsvis 0,26, 0,31 og 0,40 på tværs af alle fem datasæt.', 'hr': 'Istražujemo zadatak identifikacije kvotabilnosti, u kojem smo, s obzirom na dokument, ciljali identificirati koji je od njegovih prolaza najkvotabilniji, tj. najvjerojatnije da će biti direktno citirani kasnije izvedenim dokumentima. Približavamo identifikaciji kvotabilnosti kao problem u redovima prolaza i procjenjujemo kako dobro i modeli na osnovu funkcija i na osnovu BERT-a (Devlin et al., 2019) rankiraju prolaze u određenom dokumentu njihovom predviđenom kvotabilnošću. Istražujemo ovaj problem putem procjene na pet podataka koji šire više jezika (engleski, latinski) i genre literacije (npr. poezije, igra, romane) i čiji odgovarajući izvedeni dokumenti su od višestrukih vrsta (vijesti, članovi dnevnika). Naši eksperimenti potvrđuju relativno snažnu učinku model a na BERT-u na ovom zadatku, s najboljim modelom, označiteljem izraze RoBERTA, postižeći prosječni rho od 0,35 i NDCG@1 , 5, 50 od 0,26, 0,31 i 0,40, u svih pet podataka.', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen die Aufgabe der Quotabilit瓣tsidentifizierung, bei der wir anhand eines Dokuments ermitteln m繹chten, welche seiner Passagen am meisten zitierbar sind, d.h. am wahrscheinlichsten von sp瓣teren abgeleiteten Dokumenten direkt zitiert werden. Wir betrachten die Quotabilit瓣tsidentifikation als ein Passage-Ranking-Problem und bewerten, wie gut sowohl feature-basierte als auch BERT-basierte (Devlin et al., 2019) Modelle die Passagen in einem gegebenen Dokument nach ihrer prognostizierten Quotabilit瓣t rangieren. Wir untersuchen dieses Problem anhand von Auswertungen an f羹nf Datens瓣tzen, die mehrere Sprachen (Englisch, Latein) und Genres der Literatur (z.B. Poesie, Theaterst羹cke, Romane) umfassen und deren entsprechende abgeleitete Dokumente von mehreren Arten sind (Nachrichten, Zeitschriftenartikel). Unsere Experimente best瓣tigen die relativ starke Leistung von BERT-basierten Modellen f羹r diese Aufgabe, mit dem besten Modell, einem RoBERTA sequenziellen Satz Tagger, erreicht eine durchschnittliche Rho von 0,35 und NDCG@1 5, 50 von 0.26, 0.31 und 0.40 羹ber alle f羹nf Datens瓣tze hinweg.', 'id': 'Kami mengeksplorasi tugas identifikasi kwotabilitas, di mana, diberikan dokumen, kami bertujuan untuk mengidentifikasi mana dari bagian-bagiannya yang paling kwotabel, i.e. yang paling kemungkinan untuk dikotifikasi secara langsung oleh dokumen terhasil kemudian. Kami mendekati identifikasi kwotabilitas sebagai masalah rangkaian pasar dan mengevaluasi betapa baik model berdasarkan fitur dan berdasarkan BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) rangkaian pasar dalam dokumen tertentu oleh perkutabilitas mereka diprediksi. We explore this problem through evaluations on five datasets that span multiple languages (English, Latin) and genres of literature (e.g. poetry, plays, novels) and whose corresponding derived documents are of multiple types (news, journal articles).  Eksperimen kami mengkonfirmasi prestasi relatif kuat dari model berdasarkan BERT pada tugas ini, dengan model terbaik, sebuah tagger kalimat sekwensial RoBERTA, mencapai rata-rata rho 0,35 dan NDCG@1 , 5, 50 dari 0.26, 0.31 dan 0.40, sesuai dengan semua lima set data.', 'fa': 'ما کار شناسایی کوتابیل را تحقیق می کنیم، که در آن، به عنوان یک سند، هدف داریم که مشخص کنیم که کدام از گذشته\u200cهای آن بهترین کوتابیل هستند، یعنی احتمالاً مستقیماً توسط سند\u200cهایی که بعد از آن گرفته شده می\u200cشوند. ما به شناسایی کوتابیل به عنوان یک مشکل سطح گذاری نزدیک می\u200cشویم و ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم که هر دو مدل\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای بر پایه BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) به عنوان یک سند به عنوان کوتابیل پیش\u200cبینی آن\u200cها درجه گذاری در یک سند داده شده است. ما این مشکل را از طریق ارزیابی\u200cهای پنج مجموعه داده\u200cها تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که زبان\u200cهای متعدد (انگلیسی، لاتین) و مجموعه\u200cهای ادبیات (مثال شعر، بازی\u200cها، روزنامه\u200cها) و مدارک\u200cهای متعدد از نوع\u200cهای متعدد است. آزمایش\u200cهای ما تأیید می\u200cکنند که عملکرد نسبتاً قوی از مدل\u200cهای بنیاد BERT بر این کار، با بهترین مدل، یک تاجر جمله\u200cی دنبال روBERTA، با رسیدن یک رای متوسط 0.35 و NDCG@1 ، پنج ، پنجاه از ۰ ، ۲۶ ، ۰ ، ۳۱ و ۰ ، ۴۰ ، در تمام پنج مجموعه داده.', 'ko': '우리는 인용성 식별 임무를 연구했다. 이 임무에서 파일을 지정하고 그 중에서 어떤 단락이 가장 인용할 수 있는지, 즉 훗날의 파생 파일에 의해 직접 인용될 가능성이 가장 높은지 식별하는 것이 우리의 목표이다.우리는 인용성 식별을 하나의 단락 정렬 문제로 보고 특징 기반과 버트 기반(Devlin et al., 2019) 모델이 주어진 문서의 단락을 예측된 인용성에 따라 정렬하는 방법을 평가합니다.우리는 다양한 언어(영어, 라틴어)와 문학 장르(예를 들어 시, 연극, 소설)를 뛰어넘는 다섯 개의 데이터 집합에 대한 평가를 통해 이 문제를 연구했다. 이런 데이터 집합에 대응하는 파생 문서는 다양한 유형(뉴스, 간행물 문장)을 가지고 있다.우리의 실험은 버트 모델을 바탕으로 이 임무에서 상대적으로 강한 성능을 입증했다. 가장 좋은 모델은 RoBERTA 시퀀스 문장 표기기인데 평균 rho는 0.35와 0.5이다.NDCG@10.26, 0.31, 0.40의 5, 50 등 다섯 가지 데이터가 모두 집중되어 있다.', 'sw': 'Tunafahamu jukumu la utambulisho wa ubora, ambapo, kwa kutumia nyaraka, tunakusudia kutambua ni nani kati ya njia zake zinazonukuliwa zaidi, yaani pengine kutanuliwa moja kwa moja na nyaraka zilizotolewa baadaye. Tunakaribia utambulisho wa ubora kama tatizo la upatikanaji wa ngazi na kutathmini vipi vizuri na mifano yenye msingi wa BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) inacheza njia katika nyaraka maalumu na utabiri wao. We explore this problem through evaluations on five datasets that span multiple languages (English, Latin) and genres of literature (e.g. poetry, plays, novels) and whose corresponding derived documents are of multiple types (news, journal articles).  Majaribio yetu yanathibitisha ufanisi wa mifano yenye msingi wa BERT kwenye kazi hii, kwa mfano bora, mpiga maneno ya RoBERTA, na kufikia kiwango cha wastani cha 0.35 na NDCG@1 , 5, 50 ya 0.26, 0.31 na 0.40, katika seti zote tano.', 'af': "Ons ondersoek die taak van quotabiliteit-identifikasie, waarin, gegewe 'n dokument, ons doel om te identifiseer watter van sy wagte is die mees quotabel, i.e. die mees waarskynlik om direk deur later afgeleide dokumente te wees. Ons het toegang tot quotabiliteit identifiseering as 'n wag rangering probleem en evalueer hoe goed beide funksie-gebaseerde en BERT-gebaseerde (Devlin et al., 2019) modele rang die wagte in 'n gegewe dokument deur hulle voorskoude quotabiliteit. Ons ondersoek hierdie probleem deur evaluasies op vyf datastelle wat veelvuldige tale (Engels, Latyn) en genre van literature (bv. poedie, speletjies, novele) en wie se ooreenstemmende afgeleide dokumente is van veelvuldige tipes (nuus, joernaal artikels). Ons eksperimente bevestig die relativies sterk effektuur van BERT-gebaseerde modele op hierdie taak, met die beste model, 'n RoBERTA sewensiele setmerker, 'n gemiddelde rho van 0.35 en NDCG@1 , 5, 50 van 0. 26, 0. 31 en 0. 40, respectively, oor alle vyf datastelle.", 'sq': 'Ne eksplorojmë detyrën e identifikimit të kwotabilitetit, në të cilin, duke dhënë një dokument, synojmë të identifikojmë cilat nga pasazhet e tij janë më të kwotablet, që do të thotë më shumë gjasa të citohen drejtpërdrejt nga dokumentet e ardhshme më vonë. Ne afrohemi identifikimit të kwotabilitetit si një problem i renditjes së pasazheve dhe vlerësojmë se sa mirë modelet bazuar në funksione dhe BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) renditen pasazhet në një dokument të caktuar sipas kwotabilitetit të parashikuar të tyre. Ne e eksplorojmë këtë problem nëpërmjet vlerësimeve në pesë grupe të dhënash që përhapin gjuhë të shumta (anglisht, latin) dhe xhenera të letërsisë (për shembull poezi, lojra, romane) dhe dokumentet e tyre të përdorura janë të llojeve të shumta (lajme, artikuj të ditarit). Eksperimentet tona konfirmojnë performancën relativisht të fortë të modeleve të bazuar në BERT në këtë detyrë, me modelin më të mirë, një shënues sekuencial të fjalëve RoBERTA, duke arritur një rho mesatare 0.35 dhe NDCG@1 , 5, 50 nga 0.26, 0.31 dhe 0.40, respektivisht, në të pesë datasets.', 'am': 'የሥልጣን ግንኙነት ማድረግ እናፈልጋለን፤ በዚያም ሰነድ ሰነድ የሰጠን መግቢያ ማናቸው መሆኑን እናውቃለን፡፡ የሥርዓት ግንኙነት መግለጫ መሆኑን እና የፊደል ግንኙነት እና BERT-based (Devlin et al., 2019) ሞዴላዎች በተወሰነ ሰነ ሰነድ የተባለው ሥርዓት የሥርዓት ግንኙነቶችን እንዴት ያሳያል እናውቃለን፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ በብዙ ቋንቋዎች (እንግሊዝኛ፣ ላቲን) እና የሐይመት ቋንቋዎች (ለምሳሌ ባለ ቅኔ፣ የጫማዎች፣ ጉዳዮች) እና የተባለው ሰነዶች በብዙ ዓይነት ናቸው፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን የዚህ ስራ ላይ የBERT-ተመሳሳይ ዓይነቶችን በሚያሳየው የበለጠ ምሳሌ፣ የሮብERTA የክፍለ ቃላት መግለጫ፣ የ. NDCG@1 ፣ 5፣ 50፣ 0.26፣ 0.31 እና 0.40፣ በአምስቱ ዳታተሮች ሁሉ ላይ ነው፡፡', 'tr': 'Biz sitetlik identifikaçynyň görevini keşfedýäris. Bir sened berildi, onuň pasajynyň i ň köp sitetlidigini tanamak isleýäris, yani soňra çykan senedler tarapyndan iň köp sitetlidir. Biz quotabiliýat identifikaýasyny geçiş derejesi meselesi hökmünde we BERT tabanlygynda (Devlin et al., 2019) modelleriniň önlenen noktalaryna görä geçişlerini belirleýäris. Biz bu meseleni beş veri setirlerinden çykyp bilýän çykyşlar bilen g özleýän bir näçe dil (iňlisçe, latin) we edebiýatlyk (meseläpdir, şahyr, oýunlar, romanlar) we olaryň meňzeş seneleri birnäçe çe şitli (täzelikler, günlük artilleri) d Biziň deneylerimiz BERT tabanly nusgalaryň relativ güýçli ukyplaryny tassyklaýar, gowy nusga bilen, RoBERTA täsirli sözlemler etiketçisi, 0.35 we orta rou ýetişip barýar. NDCG@1 , 5, 50 0.26, 0.31 we 0.40, respectively, tüm beş veri toplamlaryň arasynda.', 'hy': 'Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք քվիտավորելիության հայտնաբերման խնդիրը, որտեղ փաստաթղթի առնելով մենք նպատակում ենք հայտնաբերել, թե որն է իր հատվածներից ամենախուսափելի, այսինքն, ամենահավանական է, որ դրանք անմիջապես մեջբերվում են հետագա ստացված փաստաթղ Մենք մոտենում ենք քվիտալիվության հայտնաբերման որպես հատվածի դասակարգման խնդիր և գնահատում ենք, թե ինչքան լավ են ինչպես հատկանիշներով հիմնված, ինչպես նաև BER-ով հիմնված (Devin et al., 2019) մոդելները դասակարգվում տվյալ փաստաթղթի հատվածները իրենց կանխատեսված քվի Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք այս խնդիրը հինգ տվյալների համակարգի գնահատումների միջոցով, որոնք ընդգրկում են բազմաթիվ լեզուներ (անգլերեն, լատիներեն) և գրականության գենդերներ (օրինակ պոեզիա, խաղեր, վեպեր) և որոնց համապատասխան արդյունքները բազմաթիվ տեսակների Մեր փորձարկումները հաստատում են BER-ի հիմնված մոդելների համեմատաբար ուժեղ արտադրողությունը այս խնդրի վրա, լավագույն մոդելի օգնությամբ, ՌոBERՏA-ի հաջորդական նախադասությունների նշան, հասնելով միջին Ռոյի 0,35 և NDCG@1 , 5, 50 of 0.26, 0.31 and 0.40, respectively, across all five datasets.', 'az': 'Biz qutabilik kimlińüin in i Ňüin i keŇüfetirik. Bel…ô ki, bir bel…ôd…ô verilmiŇü, onun ke√ßiŇül…ôrind…ôn hansńĪnńĪn …ôn √ßox qutabilir olduńüunu t…ôsdiql…ôm…ôk ist…ôyirik, yani daha sonra tapńĪlmńĪŇü bel…ôl…ôr t…ôsdiql…ônm…ôk olaraq. Biz qutabiliyy…ôt t…ôsdiql…ônm…ôsin…ô yaxńĪnlaŇüdńĪrńĪrńĪq v…ô t…ôsdiql…ônmiŇü qutabiliyy…ôtl…ôrin…ô g√∂r…ô bel…ô yazńĪlmńĪŇü bel…ôd…ô yazńĪlmńĪŇü s…ôhif…ôl…ôrd…ô ke√ß…ôn modell…ôrin nec…ô g√∂z…ôl t…ôsdiql…ônm…ôsini t…ômin edirik. Biz bu problemi beŇü veril…ôn qurńüular il…ô m√ľ…ôyy…ôn edirik ki, √ßoxlu dill…ôr (ńįngiliz…ô, Latin …ô) v…ô literatura (m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôr, Ňüair, oyunlar, romanlar) v…ô onlarńĪn m√ľqayis…ôd…ô olan m…ôlumatlarńĪ √ßoxlu c√ľr t…ôrzl…ôrdir (x…ôb…ôrl…ôr, g √ľnl√ľk m…ôlumatlar). Bizim t…ôcr√ľb…ôl…ôrimiz bu iŇüd…ô BERT tabanlńĪ modell…ôrin √ßox q√ľvv…ôtli performansńĪnńĪ t…ôsdiql…ôyir, …ôn yaxŇüńĪ modell…ôrl…ô, RoBERTA se√ß…ôn c√ľml…ôl…ôr etiket√ßisi il…ô, ortalama rho 0.35 v…ô NDCG@1 , 5, 50, 0, 26, 0, 31 v…ô 0, 40, b√ľt√ľn beŇü veri qurularńĪnda.', 'ca': "Explorem la tasca d'identificació de la citabilitat, en la qual, dada un document, volem identificar quins dels seus passatges són els més citables, és a dir, els més probables de ser citats directament per documents derivats més tard. We approach quotability identification as a passage ranking problem and evaluate how well both feature-based and BERT-based (Devlin et al., 2019) models rank the passages in a given document by their predicted quotability.  Explorem aquest problema a través d'evaluacions de cinc conjunts de dades que abarcan múltiples llengües (anglès, llatí) i g èneres de literatura (per exemple poesia, jocs, novels) i que els documents derivats correspondents són de múltiples tipus (notícies, articles de diari). Els nostres experiments confirmen el rendiment relativament fort dels models basats en BERT en aquesta tasca, amb el millor model, un etiquetador seqüencial de frases RoBERTA, aconseguint una mitjana de rho de 0,35 i NDCG@1 , 5, 50 de 0,26, 0,31 i 0,40, respectivament, en tots els cinc conjunts de dades.", 'bn': 'আমরা উদ্ধৃতি পরিচিতির কাজ খুঁজে বের করি, যার মধ্যে একটি নথি দিয়ে আমরা চেষ্টা করছি যে এর পাসপেজের মধ্যে কে সবচেয়ে বেশী উদ্ধৃত, যেমন পরবর্তী নথিপত্র দ্বারা সরাসরি উদ আমরা একটি প্যাসেজ রেঙ্কিং সমস্যা হিসেবে উদ্ধৃতির পরিচয়পত্রের কাছে পৌঁছে যাই এবং বিবের্ট ভিত্তিক এবং বিবের্ট ভিত্তিক (ডেভেলিনেট আল, ২০১৯) মডেলের ম আমরা এই সমস্যাকে পাঁচটি ডাটাসেটের মাধ্যমে মূল্যবোধের মাধ্যমে খুঁজে বের করি যেগুলো বেশ কয়েকটি ভাষা (ইংরেজি, ল্যাটিন) এবং সাহিত্যের জিনিস (উদাহরণস্বরূপ কবিতা, খেলা, না আমাদের পরীক্ষা এই কাজের উপর ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক মডেলের আকর্ষণীয় শক্তিশালী প্রদর্শনের নিশ্চিত করে, সেরা মডেল, রোবেরেটার পরবর্তী শাস্তি ট্যাগার, যার গড় NDCG@1 পাঁচটি তথ্য সেটের মধ্যে ৫০, ০. ২৬, ০. ৩১ এবং ০. ৪০।', 'cs': 'Zkoumáme úkol identifikace citovatelnosti, v níž se při daném dokumentu snažíme určit, které z jeho pasáží jsou nejvíce citovatelné, tj. největší pravděpodobnost, že budou přímo citovány později odvozenými dokumenty. Identifikaci citability přistupujeme jako problém hodnocení pasáží a hodnotíme, jak dobře modely založené na funkcích a BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) hodnotí pasáže v daném dokumentu podle jejich předpokládané citability. Tento problém zkoumáme prostřednictvím hodnocení na pěti datových souborech, které zahrnují více jazyků (angličtina, latina) a žánrů literatury (např. poezie, hry, romány) a jejichž odpovídající odvozené dokumenty jsou více typů (zprávy, časopisové články). Naše experimenty potvrzují relativně silnou výkonnost modelů založených na BERT na tomto úkolu, s nejlepším modelem, sekvenčním tagerem vět RoBERTA, dosahujícím průměrné rho 0,35 a NDCG@1 5, 50 z 0.26, 0.31 a 0.40 napříč všemi pěti datovými sadami.', 'bs': 'Istražujemo zadatak identifikacije kvotabilnosti, u kojem smo, s obzirom na dokument, ciljali identificirati koji je od njegovih prolaza najkvotabilniji, tj. najvjerojatnije da će biti direktno citirani kasnije izvedenim dokumentima. Približavamo identifikaciji kvotabilnosti kao problem u redovima prolaza i procjenjujemo kako dobro i modeli na osnovu funkcija i na osnovu BERT-a (Devlin et al., 2019) rankiraju prolaze u određenom dokumentu njihovim predviđenim kvotabilnošću. Istražujemo ovaj problem putem procjene na pet podataka koje šire više jezika (engleski, latinski) i genre literature (npr. poezije, igra, romane) i čiji odgovarajući izvedeni dokumenti su od višestrukih vrsta (vijesti, članovi dnevnika). Naši eksperimenti potvrđuju relativno jaku učinku model a na BERT-u na ovom zadatku, sa najboljim modelom, označiteljem rečenica RoBERTA, postižeći prosječni rho od 0,35 i NDCG@1 , 5, 50 od 0,26, 0,31 i 0,40, u svih pet podataka.', 'et': 'Uurime tsiteeritavuse tuvastamise ülesannet, kus dokumendi puhul püüame tuvastada, millised selle lõigud on kõige tsiteeritavamad, st kõige tõenäolisemad, mida hilisemad tuletatud dokumendid otseselt tsiteerivad. Läheneme tsitaatsuse tuvastamisele kui läbipääsu järjestamise probleemile ja hindame, kui hästi nii funktsioonipõhised kui ka BERT-põhised mudelid järjestavad antud dokumendi lõigud prognoositava tsitaatsuse järgi. Me uurime seda probleemi läbi viie andmekogumi hindamise, mis hõlmavad mitut keelt (inglise, ladina) ja kirjanduse žanreid (nt luule, näidendid, romaanid) ning mille vastavad tuletatud dokumendid on mitut tüüpi (uudised, ajakirjaartiklid). Meie eksperimendid kinnitavad BERT-põhiste mudelite suhteliselt tugevat jõudlust selles ülesandes, kusjuures parim mudel, RoBERTA järjestikune lausemärgistaja, saavutab keskmise rho 0,35 ja NDCG@1 vastavalt 5, 50 0,26, 0,31 ja 0,40 kõigis viies andmekogumis.', 'fi': 'Tutkimme siteerattavuuden tunnistamisen tehtävää, jossa dokumentin perusteella pyrimme tunnistamaan, mitkä sen kohdat ovat siteerattavimpia eli mitä todennäköisimmin myöhemmissä johdetuissa asiakirjoissa siteerataan. Lähestymme siteerattavuuden tunnistamista siirtymän ranking-ongelmana ja arvioimme, kuinka hyvin sekä ominaisuuspohjaiset että BERT-pohjaiset mallit (Devlin et al., 2019) luokittelevat tietyn asiakirjan kohdat ennustetun siteerattavuuden perusteella. Tutkimme tätä ongelmaa arvioimalla viittä aineistoa, jotka kattavat useita kieliä (englanti, latina) ja kirjallisuuden genrejä (esim. runous, näytelmät, romaanit) ja joiden vastaavat johdetut asiakirjat ovat monityyppisiä (uutiset, lehtiartikkelit). Kokeemme vahvistavat BERT-pohjaisten mallien suhteellisen vahvan suorituskyvyn tässä tehtävässä, kun paras malli, RoBERTA-sekvenssiaalilausetagger, saavutti keskimääräisen rho-arvon 0,35 ja NDCG@1 5, 50 0,26, 0,31 ja 0,40 kaikissa viidessä aineistossa.', 'he': 'אנו חוקרים את המשימה של זיהוי ציטוטיות, שבה, בהתחשב במסמך, אנו מתכוונים לזהות איזה מהמעברים שלו הם הכי ציטוטים, כלומר הכי סביר שיציטוטים ישירות על ידי מסמכים שנוצאים מאוחר יותר. אנו מתקרבים לזהות ציטוטיות כבעיה מדרגת מעבר ולעריך עד כמה גם דוגמנים מבוססים על תכונות ומבוססים על BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) מדרגים את העברים במסמך מסוים מסוים על ידי ציטוטיות צפויה שלהם. אנו חוקרים את הבעיה הזאת באמצעות הערכות על חמישה קבוצות נתונים שמרחבות שפות רבות (אנגלית, לטינית) וגנרס של ספרות (למשל שירה, משחקים, רומנים) והמסמכים הנוצאים המתאימים שלהם הם מסוגים רבים (חדשות, מאמרי יומן). Our experiments confirm the relatively strong performance of BERT-based models on this task, with the best model, a RoBERTA sequential sentence tagger, achieving an average rho of 0.35 and  NDCG@1 , 5, 50 של 0.26, 0.31 ו-0.40, בהתאם, בכל חמש קבוצות נתונים.', 'ha': "Tuna karatun aikin shaidar qunci, a cikinsa, da aka bai wa takardar, za mu yi amfani da wajen gane wanne daga takardar nan da za'a iya faɗa ɗa, misali, za'a quoten takardar da ke ƙara. Mu motsa shaidar quotenci kamar wata matabbata mai saurãre matsayin sarauta kuma Mu ƙaddara misalin misãlai masu bincike da BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) su sarraya matsayin a cikin takardar da aka ƙayyade su. Za karatun wannan masu zartarwa a bayan tun-bayani masu karatun misãlan littafin (Ingiriya, Latin) da sauran littafi (misali misãlan mawaƙi, yin raɗu, da takardu) da kuma masu daidai da takardar da aka samu, su ne masu cikin wasu misãlai (masu rubutun da aka rubũta). Kayan jarrabõyinmu, suna gaskata mafiya ƙarfin misãlai na BERT a kan wannan aikin, da mafi kyaun motsi, a lokacin kalma na RoBERTA, kuma yana samun babban rabo na 0.35 da NDCG@1 ,", 'sk': 'Raziskujemo nalogo identifikacije citativnosti, pri kateri nameravamo glede na dokument ugotoviti, kateri del njegovih odlomkov je najbolj citiran, tj. najverjetneje, da ga bodo neposredno citirali kasneje izpeljani dokumenti. Identifikacijo citativnosti obravnavamo kot problem razvrščanja prehodov in ocenimo, kako dobro modeli na podlagi funkcij in BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) razvrščajo odlomke v danem dokumentu glede na njihovo predvideno citativnost. Ta problem raziskujemo skozi vrednotenje petih naborov podatkov, ki obsegajo več jezikov (angleščina, latinščina) in zvrsti literature (npr. poezija, drame, romani) in katerih ustrezni izpeljani dokumenti so več vrst (novice, članki v reviji). Naši eksperimenti potrjujejo relativno močno delovanje BERT-ovih modelov pri tej nalogi, z najboljšim modelom, RoBERTA zaporednim označevalnikom stavkov, ki doseže povprečno rho 0,35 in NDCG@1 5, 50 od 0,26, 0,31 oziroma 0,40 v vseh petih naborih podatkov.', 'bo': 'We explore the task of quotability identification, in which, given a document, we aim to identify which of its passages are the most quotable, i.e. the most likely to be directly quoted by later derived documents. We approach quotability identification as a passage ranking problem and evaluate how well both feature-based and BERT-based (Devlin et al., 2019) models rank the passages in a given document by their predicted quotability. We explore this problem through evaluations on five datasets that span multiple languages (English, Latin) and genres of literature (e.g. poetry, plays, novels) and whose corresponding derived documents are of multiple types (news, journal articles). ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གིས་བྱ་ཚིག་ནི་BERT-གཞི་རྟེན་པའི་མིག NDCG@1 ཉིན་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་ཡོངས་ལ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nglanggar aturan tapi nggawe kesalakno, dadi, nggawe dokumen; awak dhéwé kepengin nggawe kamu pasarané sing mbukakipo sing yes We access limiting Awak dhéwé éntuk perbudhakan iki sak ngewehku akeh sampeyan luwih dataset sing sak butakon langgar sampeyan (Ingalas, Latin é) lan genr-entekaké Kemerdekaan Awakdhéwé éntuk dhéwé nggawe barang nggawe paten nggawe model sing basa BERT-basa nang nggawe iki dadi, karo model sing apik dhéwé, tagger rambarang rambarang, ditambah sabên Rong Singh, sing paling dhéwé NDCG@1 , 5, 60, 0.31 lan 0.30, tambah, gayutan, nganggo lima dataset'}
{'en': 'Lexical Normalization for Code-switched Data and its Effect on POS Tagging', 'es': 'Normalización léxica para datos de conmutación de código y su efecto en el etiquetado de PDV', 'fr': 'Normalisation lexicale pour les données commutées par code et son effet sur le marquage POS', 'pt': 'Normalização léxica para dados comutados por código e seu efeito na marcação POS', 'ar': 'التطبيع المعجمي للبيانات المبدلة بالشفرة وتأثيرها على توصيف نقاط البيع', 'ja': 'コードスイッチされたデータの正規化とPOSタグ付けへの影響', 'zh': '代码切换数词法规范化及 POS 标记', 'hi': 'कोड-स्विच किए गए डेटा के लिए लेक्सिकल सामान्यीकरण और पीओएस टैगिंग पर इसका प्रभाव', 'ru': 'Лексическая нормализация для данных с коммутацией кода и ее влияние на маркировку POS', 'ga': 'Normalú Foclaíochta do Shonraí Cóid-aistrithe agus a Éifeacht ar Chlibeáil POS', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Λεξικό Κανονικοποίηση για δεδομένα μεταγωγής κώδικα και η επίδρασή της στην επισήμανση POS', 'hu': 'Lexikus normalizáció a kódkapcsolt adatokhoz és annak hatása a POS címkézésre', 'lt': 'Kodu pakeistų duomenų leksinis normalizavimas ir jo poveikis POS ženklinimui', 'it': "Normalizzazione lessica per i dati a commutazione di codice e il suo effetto sull'etichettatura POS", 'ms': 'Lexical Normalization for Code-switched Data and its Effect on POS Tagging', 'kk': 'Код ауыстырылған деректер мен оның POS тегтерінің эффекті үшін лексикалық нормализациясы', 'mk': 'Lexical Normalization for Code-switched Data and its Effect on POS Tagging', 'ml': 'കോഡ്- മാറ്റിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d നോര്\u200dമാലിഷനേഷനും പോസ് ടാഗിങ്ങില്\u200d അതിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം', 'mn': 'Код-өөрчлөгдсөн өгөгдлийн болон POS Tagging дээр нөлөө үзүүлэх', 'mt': 'Normalizzazzjoni Lessika għad-Dejta mibdula bil-Kodiċi u l-Effett tagħha fuq it-Tagging POS', 'no': 'Leksiske normalisering for kodbytt data og effekten på POS- merking', 'pl': 'Leksykalna normalizacja danych przełączonych kodem i jej wpływ na tagowanie POS', 'ro': 'Normalizarea lexicală a datelor schimbate de cod și efectul acestora asupra etichetării POS', 'so': 'Normalization for Code-Switched Data and its Effect on POS Tagging', 'sr': 'Leksička normalizacija podataka koji su promijenili kod i njegov uticaj na označavanje POS-a', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'Name', 'sv': 'Lexisk normalisering för kodväxlade data och dess effekt på POS-märkning', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Truyền thống ngôn ngữ mẫu cho dữ liệu đã chuyển đổi và hiệu ứng của nó trên thẻ POS', 'hr': 'Leksička normalizacija podataka koji su promijenili kod i njegov učinak na označavanje POS-a', 'bg': 'Лексикална нормализация за кодово превключени данни и ефектът й върху маркирането на ПОС', 'da': 'Lexisk normalisering for kodekopplicerede data og dens virkning på POS-mærkning', 'nl': 'Lexische normalisatie voor code-switched data en het effect ervan op POS tagging', 'id': 'Normalisasi Lexik untuk Data Bertukar Kode dan Efeknya pada Tagging POS', 'ko': '코드 변환 데이터의 어법 규범화 및 어성 표시에 대한 영향', 'fa': 'Name', 'de': 'Lexische Normalisierung von Code-Switched Data und ihre Auswirkungen auf POS-Tagging', 'tr': 'Name', 'sw': 'Udhalilishaji wa Kilexico kwa Kubadilisha Taarifa na Effecto yake kwenye Uwekezaji wa POS', 'sq': 'Normalizimi leksikal për të dhënat e ndryshuara me kod dhe efekti i saj në etiketën POS', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Գործիքով փոխված տվյալների լեքսիկական նորմալիզացիա և դրա ազդեցությունը POS նշանների վրա', 'az': 'Kod-dəyişdirilmiş verilər və POS etiketlərinin etkisi üçün ləksik normalizacija', 'bs': 'Leksička normalizacija podataka koji su promijenili kod i njegov učinak na označavanje POS-a', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'ca': "Normalització lècsica per a les dades canviades de codi i el seu efecte en l'etiqueta POS", 'bn': 'কোড- পরিবর্তিত তথ্য এবং পোস ট্যাগিং এর প্রভাব', 'et': 'Koodi vahetatud andmete leksiline normaliseerimine ja selle mõju POS märgistusele', 'fi': 'Koodikäytteisen datan Lexical Normalization ja sen vaikutus POS-merkintään', 'cs': 'Lexická normalizace pro data přepínaná kódem a její vliv na tagování POS', 'jv': 'checkbox', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Lexična normalizacija podatkov s preklopom kod in njegov učinek na označevanje POS', 'he': 'נורמליזציה לקסית עבור נתונים המחליפים קודים וההשפעה שלהם על תג POS', 'bo': 'POS Tagging'}
{'en': 'Lexical normalization, the translation of non-canonical data to standard language, has shown to improve the performance of many natural language processing tasks on social media. Yet, using multiple languages in one utterance, also called code-switching (CS), is frequently overlooked by these normalization systems, despite its common use in social media. In this paper, we propose three normalization models specifically designed to handle code-switched data which we evaluate for two language pairs : Indonesian-English and Turkish-German. For the latter, we introduce novel normalization layers and their corresponding language ID and POS tags for the dataset, and evaluate the downstream effect of normalization on POS tagging. Results show that our CS-tailored normalization models significantly outperform monolingual ones, and lead to 5.4 % relative performance increase for POS tagging as compared to unnormalized input.', 'ar': 'أظهر التطبيع المعجمي ، وهو ترجمة البيانات غير المتعارف عليها إلى لغة قياسية ، تحسين أداء العديد من مهام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. ومع ذلك ، فإن استخدام لغات متعددة في كلام واحد ، والذي يسمى أيضًا تبديل الشفرة (CS) ، غالبًا ما يتم تجاهله من قبل أنظمة التطبيع هذه ، على الرغم من استخدامها الشائع في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح ثلاثة نماذج تطبيع مصممة خصيصًا للتعامل مع بيانات تبديل الكود والتي نقوم بتقييمها لزوجين من اللغات: الإندونيسية-الإنجليزية والتركية-الألمانية. بالنسبة للأخير ، نقدم طبقات تطبيع جديدة ومعرف اللغة المقابلة لها وعلامات نقاط البيع لمجموعة البيانات ، وتقييم تأثير المصب للتطبيع على علامات نقاط البيع. تُظهر النتائج أن نماذج التطبيع المصممة خصيصًا لـ CS الخاصة بنا تتفوق بشكل كبير على النماذج أحادية اللغة ، وتؤدي إلى زيادة نسبية في الأداء بنسبة 5.4٪ في وضع علامات POS مقارنة بالإدخال غير الطبيعي.', 'pt': 'A normalização léxica, a tradução de dados não canônicos para o idioma padrão, mostrou melhorar o desempenho de muitas tarefas de processamento de linguagem natural nas mídias sociais. No entanto, o uso de vários idiomas em um enunciado, também chamado de troca de código (CS), é frequentemente negligenciado por esses sistemas de normalização, apesar de seu uso comum nas mídias sociais. Neste artigo, propomos três modelos de normalização projetados especificamente para lidar com dados comutados por código que avaliamos para dois pares de idiomas: indonésio-inglês e turco-alemão. Para o último, introduzimos novas camadas de normalização e seus IDs de idioma e tags POS correspondentes para o conjunto de dados e avaliamos o efeito downstream da normalização na marcação POS. Os resultados mostram que nossos modelos de normalização adaptados para CS superam significativamente os monolíngues e levam a um aumento de desempenho relativo de 5,4% para marcação POS em comparação com entrada não normalizada.', 'es': 'La normalización léxica, la traducción de datos no canónicos a un lenguaje estándar, ha demostrado mejorar el rendimiento de muchas tareas de procesamiento del lenguaje natural en las redes sociales. Sin embargo, estos sistemas de normalización suelen pasar por alto el uso de varios idiomas en un enunciado, también llamado cambio de código (CS), a pesar de su uso común en las redes sociales. En este artículo, proponemos tres modelos de normalización diseñados específicamente para manejar datos de cambio de código que evaluamos para dos pares de idiomas: indonesio-inglés y turco-alemán. Para esto último, introducimos capas de normalización novedosas y sus etiquetas de PDV y ID de idioma correspondientes para el conjunto de datos, y evaluamos el efecto descendente de la normalización en el etiquetado de PDV. Los resultados muestran que nuestros modelos de normalización adaptados a CS superan significativamente a los monolingües y conducen a un aumento del rendimiento relativo del 5,4% para el etiquetado de PDV en comparación con los datos no normalizados.', 'fr': "La normalisation lexicale, c'est-à-dire la traduction de données non canoniques en langage standard, a permis d'améliorer les performances de nombreuses tâches de traitement du langage naturel sur les réseaux sociaux. Pourtant, l'utilisation de plusieurs langues dans un énoncé, également appelée commutation de code (CS), est souvent négligée par ces systèmes de normalisation, malgré son utilisation courante dans les médias sociaux. Dans cet article, nous proposons trois modèles de normalisation spécialement conçus pour traiter des données à commutation de code que nous évaluons pour deux paires de langues\xa0: indonésien-anglais et turco-allemand. Pour ce dernier, nous introduisons de nouvelles couches de normalisation et leurs ID de langue et balises POS correspondants pour le jeu de données, et évaluons l'effet en aval de la normalisation sur le balisage POS. Les résultats montrent que nos modèles de normalisation personnalisés par CS surpassent largement les modèles monolingues et entraînent une augmentation des performances relatives de 5,4\xa0% pour le marquage POS par rapport aux entrées non normalisées.", 'zh': '词汇规范化,转非规数为率,已验可增社交媒体上多自然语言治者。 然一语之用多种语言(亦谓之代码切换(CS))常为此规范化所忽,虽常见于社交媒体。 本文三造代码切换数规范化模形,两语评估:印度尼西亚语 - 英语、土耳其语 - 德语。 其于后者,引入新规范化及应数集语ID与POS标签,并评规范化对POS标签之下流。 结果表明吾 CS 制归一化明优于单语,与非规范化输,POS 表相高 5.4%矣。', 'ja': '非正準データの標準言語への翻訳を含む語彙正規化は、ソーシャルメディア上の多くの自然言語処理タスクのパフォーマンスを改善することが示されている。しかし、コードスイッチング（ CS ）とも呼ばれる複数の言語を1つの発話で使用することは、ソーシャルメディアで一般的に使用されているにもかかわらず、これらの正規化システムによって頻繁に見落とされています。この論文では、コードスイッチされたデータを扱うために特別に設計された3つの正規化モデルを提案します。これは、インドネシア語-英語とトルコ語-ドイツ語の2つの言語ペアについて評価します。後者については、データセットに新規の正規化層とその対応する言語IDとPOSタグを導入し、POSタグ付けに対する正規化の下流効果を評価する。結果は、CS仕様の正規化モデルが単一言語モデルを大幅に上回り、非正規化された入力と比較してPOSタグのパフォーマンスが5.4%向上することを示しています。', 'hi': 'लेक्सिकल सामान्यीकरण, मानक भाषा के लिए गैर-विहित डेटा का अनुवाद, सोशल मीडिया पर कई प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण कार्यों के प्रदर्शन में सुधार करने के लिए दिखाया गया है। फिर भी, एक उच्चारण में कई भाषाओं का उपयोग करना, जिसे कोड-स्विचिंग (सीएस) भी कहा जाता है, सोशल मीडिया में इसके सामान्य उपयोग के बावजूद, इन सामान्यीकरण प्रणालियों द्वारा अक्सर अनदेखी की जाती है। इस पेपर में, हम विशेष रूप से कोड-स्विचकिए गए डेटा को संभालने के लिए डिज़ाइन किए गए तीन सामान्यीकरण मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिन्हें हम दो भाषा जोड़े के लिए मूल्यांकन करते हैं: इंडोनेशियाई-अंग्रेजी और तुर्की-जर्मन। उत्तरार्द्ध के लिए, हम डेटासेट के लिए उपन्यास सामान्यीकरण परतों और उनके संबंधित भाषा आईडी और पीओएस टैग पेश करते हैं, और पीओएस टैगिंग पर सामान्यीकरण के डाउनस्ट्रीम प्रभाव का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारे सीएस-अनुरूप सामान्यीकरण मॉडल मोनोलिंगुअल लोगों को काफी बेहतर बनाते हैं, और सामान्यीकृत इनपुट की तुलना में पीओएस टैगिंग के लिए 5.4% सापेक्ष प्रदर्शन वृद्धि का कारण बनते हैं।', 'ru': 'Лексическая нормализация, перевод неканонических данных на стандартный язык, показала улучшение выполнения многих задач по обработке естественного языка в социальных сетях. Тем не менее, использование нескольких языков в одном высказывании, также называемом переключением кода (CS), часто упускается из виду этими системами нормализации, несмотря на его широкое использование в социальных сетях. В этой статье мы предлагаем три модели нормализации, специально разработанные для обработки данных с переключением кода, которые мы оцениваем для двух языковых пар: индонезийско-английской и турецко-германской. Для последнего мы вводим новые слои нормализации и их соответствующие идентификаторы языка и POS-теги для датасета, а также оцениваем влияние нормализации на POS-метки. Результаты показывают, что наши модели нормализации, адаптированные под CS, значительно превосходят одноязычные и приводят к увеличению относительной производительности на 5,4% для маркировки POS по сравнению с ненормализованным вводом.', 'ga': 'Tá sé léirithe ag normalú foclóireachta, aistriú sonraí neamhchanónacha go teanga chaighdeánach, feabhas a chur ar fheidhmíocht go leor tascanna próiseála teanga nádúrtha ar na meáin shóisialta. Mar sin féin, is minic a thugann na córais normalaithe seo neamhaird ar úsáid a bhaint as teangacha iolracha in aon chaint amháin, ar a dtugtar malartú cóid (CS) freisin, in ainneoin a n-úsáide coitianta sna meáin shóisialta. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid trí mhúnla normalaithe atá deartha go sonrach chun sonraí códmhalartaithe a láimhseáil a ndéanaimid measúnú orthu do dhá phéire teanga: Indinéisis-Béarla agus Tuircis-Gearmáinis. Maidir leis an dara ceann, tugaimid isteach sraitheanna normalaithe núíosacha agus a gcuid clibeanna aitheantais teanga agus POS comhfhreagracha don tacar sonraí, agus déanaimid measúnú ar éifeacht iartheachtach an normalaithe ar chlibeáil POS. Léiríonn na torthaí go sáraíonn ár múnlaí normalaithe CS-oiriúnaithe go suntasach na samhlacha aonteangacha, agus go n-eascraíonn méadú coibhneasta 5.4% ar fheidhmíocht do chlibeáil POS i gcomparáid le hionchur neamhnormalaithe.', 'hu': 'A lexikális normalizáció, a nem kanonikus adatok standard nyelvre történő fordítása bizonyította, hogy javítja számos természetes nyelvfeldolgozási feladat teljesítményét a közösségi médián. Ennek ellenére a normalizációs rendszerek gyakran figyelmen kívül hagyják a több nyelv használatát egyetlen kifejezésben, más néven kódkapcsolásnak (CS), annak ellenére, hogy a közösségi médiában gyakori használata. Ebben a tanulmányban három olyan normalizációs modellt javasolunk, amelyeket kifejezetten kódkapcsolt adatok kezelésére terveztünk, amelyeket két nyelvpárra értékelünk: indonéz-angol és török-német. Ez utóbbi esetében új normalizációs rétegeket és azok megfelelő nyelvi azonosítóját és POS címkéit vezetünk be az adatkészlethez, és értékeljük a normalizáció downstream hatását a POS címkézésre. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy CS-személyre szabott normalizációs modelleink jelentősen felülmúlják az egynyelvűeket, és 5,4%-os relatív teljesítménynövekedést eredményeznek a POS-címkézés esetében a nem formális bemenethez képest.', 'el': 'Η λεξική εξομάλυνση, η μετάφραση μη κανονικών δεδομένων σε τυπική γλώσσα, έχει δείξει ότι βελτιώνει την απόδοση πολλών εργασιών επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Ωστόσο, η χρήση πολλαπλών γλωσσών σε μία ομιλία, που ονομάζεται και αλλαγή κώδικα (CS), συχνά παραβλέπεται από αυτά τα συστήματα ομαλοποίησης, παρά την κοινή χρήση της στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε τρία μοντέλα ομαλοποίησης ειδικά σχεδιασμένα για τη διαχείριση δεδομένων μεταγωγής κώδικα τα οποία αξιολογούμε για δύο γλωσσικά ζεύγη: Ινδονησιακά-Αγγλικά και Τουρκικά-Γερμανικά. Για το τελευταίο, εισάγουμε νέα στρώματα ομαλοποίησης και τις αντίστοιχες ετικέτες γλώσσας και γλώσσας για το σύνολο δεδομένων, και αξιολογούμε την μεταγενέστερη επίδραση της ομαλοποίησης στη σήμανση. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι τα προσαρμοσμένα μοντέλα ομαλοποίησης μας ξεπερνούν σημαντικά τα μονογλωσσικά μοντέλα και οδηγούν σε 5,4% σχετική αύξηση απόδοσης για τη σήμανση σε σύγκριση με την μη κανονική εισαγωγή.', 'ka': 'ლექსიკალური ნორმალიზაცია, არ- კანონიკალური მონაცემების გადაწყვეტილება სტანდარტული ენაში, გამოჩვენებულია, რომ მრავალური თავისუფალური ენათის პროცესი დავა მაგრამ, რამდენიმე ენების გამოყენება ერთი სიტყვებში, რომელიც კოდის გადაცვლა (CS) სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა ნორმალიზაციის სისტემებით, მა ამ დოკუნში, ჩვენ სამი ნორმალიზაციის მოდელები განსაზღვრებულია, რომლებიც კოდის შეცვლა მონაცემებისთვის გამოყენება, რომლებიც ჩვენ ორი ენერგიის ზოგებისთვის გაუმუშ შემდეგ, ჩვენ ნომალური ნორმალიზაციის ჩატვირთვა და მათი შესაბამისი ენის ID და POS ჭდეების შესაბამისი მონაცემებისთვის და POS ჭდეების შესაბამისი ნორმალიზაციის ქვემოთ ეფექტის გა შედეგები ჩვენი CS-ს განსაზღვრული ნორმალიზაციის მოდელები ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანია მონორმალიზაციული მოდელების შესაძლებლობა და 5.4%-ის განსაზღვრული პროცენტის შესაძლებლობა POS-ს განსაზღვრული', 'it': "La normalizzazione lessicale, la traduzione di dati non canonici in linguaggio standard, ha dimostrato di migliorare le prestazioni di molti compiti di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale sui social media. Tuttavia, l'uso di più lingue in un'unica espressione, chiamato anche code-switching (CS), è spesso trascurato da questi sistemi di normalizzazione, nonostante il suo uso comune nei social media. In questo articolo proponiamo tre modelli di normalizzazione specificamente progettati per gestire i dati a commutazione di codice che valutiamo per due coppie linguistiche: indonesiano-inglese e turco-tedesco. Per quest'ultimo, introduciamo nuovi livelli di normalizzazione e i loro corrispondenti tag di linguaggio ID e POS per il set di dati, e valutiamo l'effetto a valle della normalizzazione sul tag POS. I risultati mostrano che i nostri modelli di normalizzazione su misura CS superano significativamente quelli monolingue e portano ad un aumento delle prestazioni relative del 5,4% per il tag POS rispetto agli input non normalizzati.", 'lt': 'Leksinė normalizacija, ne kanoniškų duomenų vertimas į standartinę kalbą, parodė, kad pagerina daugelio gamtinių kalbų apdorojimo užduočių socialinėje žiniasklaidoje vykdymą. Vis dėlto dažnai šios normalizacijos sistemos, nepaisant to, kad jos dažnai naudojamos social in ėje žiniasklaidoje, naudoja daugelį kalbų vienu žodžiu, vadinamu kodų keitimu (CS). Šiame dokumente siūlome tris normalizavimo modelius, specialiai sukurtus tvarkyti kodais pakeistus duomenis, kuriuos vertiname dviejų kalbų porų atžvilgiu: Indonezijos-anglų ir Turkijos-vokiečių. Pastaruoju atveju įvedame naujus normalizacijos sluoksnius ir jų atitinkamus kalbos identifikavimo ir POS ženklus duomenų rinkiniui ir vertiname normalizacijos poveikį POS ženklinimui. Rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų standartizacijos modeliai, pritaikyti prie CS, gerokai viršija vienkalbinius modelius ir dėl to padidėja santykinis POS ženklinimo veiksmingumas 5,4 proc., palyginti su nenormaliu įvedimu.', 'mk': 'Лексикалната нормализација, преводот на неканонични податоци на стандарден јазик, покажа подобрување на извршувањето на многу природни задачи за обработување јазик на социјалните медиуми. Сепак, користењето на повеќе јазици во еден израз, исто така наречен код-менување (CS), честопати се заборава од овие нормализациски системи, и покрај нејзината заедничка употреба во социјалните медиуми. Во овој весник предложуваме три нормализациски модели специфично дизајнирани за да се справат со податоци кои ги проценуваме за два пара јазици: индонезиско-англиско и турско-германско. For the latter, we introduce novel normalization layers and their corresponding language ID and POS tags for the dataset, and evaluate the downstream effect of normalization on POS tagging.  Резултатите покажуваат дека нашите модели за нормализација наменети на CS значително ги надминуваат монојазичните модели и водат до релативно зголемување на резултатите за POS означување во споредба со ненормализираниот влог од 5,4 отсто.', 'kk': 'Лексикалық нормализация, каноникалық емес деректерді стандартты тіліне аудару, әлеуметтік медиақтағы көптеген табиғи тілдерді өңдеу тапсырмаларын жақсартуға болады. Бірақ бір сөзде бірнеше тілдерді қолдану үшін код ауысуы (CS) деп аталады, олар әлемді социалдық медиаға қолдануға қарамастан, әртүрлі түрлерді қолдану жүйелері көп қарайды. Бұл қағаздың үш нормализациялау үлгілерін таңдаймыз. Біз код ауыстырылған деректерді өзгерту үшін құрылған, екі тілді екі тілді: Индонезия-ағылшын және Түрк-неміс. Соңғы үшін, біз романдық нормализациялау қабаттарын және оның адамдарының тіл идентификаторы мен POS тегтерін келтіріп, POS тегтерінде нормализациялау эффектін бағалаймыз. Нәтижелері CS- тізіміздің нормализациялау үлгілеріміздің бірнеше тілдік үлгілерінен артық болып, POS- тізіміздің белгілеріне салыстыру үшін 5, 4% салыстырылық ықтималдығын өзге', 'ms': 'Normalisasi leksikal, terjemahan data bukan-kanonik ke bahasa piawai, telah menunjukkan untuk meningkatkan prestasi banyak tugas pemprosesan bahasa alam pada media sosial. Namun, menggunakan bahasa berbilang dalam satu ungkapan, juga dipanggil code-switching (CS), sering dilupakan oleh sistem normalisasi ini, walaupun ia digunakan biasa dalam media sosial. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan tiga model normalisasi yang direka secara khusus untuk mengendalikan data yang ditukar-kod yang kami menilai untuk dua pasangan bahasa: Indonesia-Inggeris dan Turki-Jerman. Untuk yang terakhir, kami memperkenalkan lapisan normalisasi baru dan ID bahasa yang sepadan dan tag POS mereka untuk set data, dan menilai kesan turun normalisasi pada tag POS. Hasil menunjukkan bahawa model normalisasi yang disesuaikan CS kita secara signifikan melebihi model monobahasa, dan membawa kepada 5.4% peningkatan prestasi relatif untuk tag POS dibandingkan dengan input tidak biasa.', 'ml': 'ലെക്സിക്സിക്കല്\u200d സാധാരണ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d, സാമൂഹിക മീഡിയില്\u200d സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്ത എന്നിട്ടും ഒരു വാക്കില്\u200d പല ഭാഷകളും ഉപയോഗിച്ച്, കോഡ്- switching (CS) എന്നും വിളിക്കുന്നു. സാമൂഹ്യ മീഡിയില്\u200d അതിന്റെ സാധാരണ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d മൂന്നു സാധാരണ മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് കോഡ്-മാറ്റുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യാന്\u200d നി അവസാനത്തേക്ക്, നമ്മള്\u200d നോവല്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമാക്കുന്ന layers, അവയുടെ ഭാഷയുടെ ഐഡിയും പോസ് ടാഗുകളും പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. പോസ് ടാഗ്ഗിങ്ങിന്റെ താഴ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ CS-ടായ്ലറേഷന്\u200d സാധാരണ മോഡലുകള്\u200d മാത്രമാണ് മോണില്\u200dഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത്. പോസ് ടാഗ്ഗിങ്', 'mt': 'In-normalizzazzjoni lexika, it-traduzzjoni ta’ dejta mhux kanonika għal lingwa standard, uriet li ttejjeb il-prestazzjoni ta’ ħafna kompiti ta’ pproċessar tal-lingwi naturali fil-midja soċjali. Madankollu, l-użu ta’ diversi lingwi f’dikjarazzjoni waħda, imsejjaħ ukoll code-switching (CS), huwa spiss injorat minn dawn is-sistemi ta’ normalizzazzjoni, minkejja l-użu komuni tiegħu fil-midja soċjali. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu tliet mudelli ta’ normalizzazzjoni mfassla speċifikament biex jimmaniġġjaw dejta mibdula bil-kodiċi li jivvalutaw għal żewġ pari lingwistiċi: l-Indoneżjan-Ingliż u t-Turkiż-Ġermaniż. Għall-aħħar, aħna nintroduċu saffi ġodda ta’ normalizzazzjoni u t-tikketti tal-identità tal-lingwa u tal-POS korrispondenti tagħhom għas-sett tad-dejta, u jivvalutaw l-effett downstream tan-normalizzazzjoni fuq it-tikketti tal-POS. Ir-riżultati juru li l-mudelli ta’ normalizzazzjoni tagħna mfassla skont is-CS jaqbżu b’mod sinifikanti dawk monolingwi, u jwasslu għal żieda relattiva fil-prestazzjoni għat-tikkettar tal-POS ta’ 5.4% meta mqabbel ma’ input mhux normalizzat.', 'mn': 'Лексик нормализаци, газрын биш мэдээллийг стандарт хэл руу орлуулах нь нийгмийн мэдээлэл дээр олон байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн үйлдвэрлэлийг сайжруулах боломжтой болгодог. Гэхдээ нэг хэл дээр олон хэл ашиглаж, мөн код-шилжүүлэх (CS) гэдэг нь ихэвчлэн эдгээр нормализацийн системүүд нь нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглээнд хэрэглэгддэг ч байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид 3 нормализацийн загварыг тодорхой хэлбэрийн хоёр хэлний хооронд үнэлдэг кодыг шилжүүлсэн өгөгдлийг удирдах зориулагдсан. Индонез-Англи, Турк-Герман. Хамгийн сүүлийн үед бид шинэ нормализацийн давхарга болон өгөгдлийн сангийн харьцангуй хэл ID болон POS тэмдэгүүдийг танилцуулж, POS тэмдэглээнд нормализацийн доорх нөлөөг үнэлэх болно. Үүний үр дүнд бидний CS-д нормализацийн загварууд нь нэг хэл хэлний загваруудыг илүү чухал болгодог бөгөөд POS-ийн тэмдэглээний харьцуулахад 5.4%-ын харьцуулалттай үр дүнг нэмэгдүүлдэг.', 'ro': 'Normalizarea lexicală, traducerea datelor non-canonice în limbajul standard, a demonstrat că îmbunătățește performanța multor sarcini de procesare a limbajului natural pe rețelele de socializare. Cu toate acestea, folosirea mai multor limbi într-o singură pronunțare, numită și schimbare de cod (CS), este adesea trecută cu vederea de aceste sisteme de normalizare, în ciuda utilizării sale comune în social media. În această lucrare, propunem trei modele de normalizare concepute special pentru a gestiona datele schimbate de cod pe care le evaluăm pentru două perechi de limbi: indoneziană-engleză și turcă-germană. Pentru acestea din urmă, introducem straturi noi de normalizare și etichetele lor corespunzătoare de limbă ID și POS pentru setul de date și evaluăm efectul din aval al normalizării asupra etichetării POS. Rezultatele arată că modelele noastre de normalizare adaptate CS depășesc semnificativ cele monolingve și duc la o creștere relativă a performanței de 5,4% pentru etichetarea POS în comparație cu intrarea neormalizată.', 'pl': 'Leksykalna normalizacja, tłumaczenie danych niekanonicznych na język standardowy, pokazała, że poprawia wydajność wielu zadań przetwarzania języka naturalnego w mediach społecznościowych. Jednak używanie wielu języków w jednym wypowiedzi, zwanego również przełączaniem kodu (CS), jest często pomijane przez te systemy normalizacji, pomimo powszechnego stosowania w mediach społecznościowych. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy trzy modele normalizacji specjalnie zaprojektowane do obsługi danych przełączonych kodem, które oceniamy dla dwóch par językowych: indonezyjsko-angielskiego i turecko-niemieckiego. Dla tych ostatnich wprowadzamy nowe warstwy normalizacji i odpowiadające im identyfikatorom języka i tagom POS dla zbioru danych oraz oceniamy dalszy efekt normalizacji na tagowanie POS. Wyniki pokazują, że nasze modele normalizacji dostosowane do CS znacznie przewyższają te jednojęzyczne i prowadzą do 5,4% względnego wzrostu wydajności tagowania POS w porównaniu z nienormalizowanym wejściem.', 'no': 'Leksykisk normalisering, omsetjinga av ikkje-kanoniske data til standard språk, har vist å forbedra utviklinga av mange naturlege språkshandsamar på sosiale media. Men med fleire språk i eitt uttrykk, kalla også kodbyting (CS), vert ofte oversikt av desse normaliseringssystemene, selv om det vanlege bruk i sosiale media. I denne papiret foreslår vi tre normaliseringsmodular spesielt utforma for å handtere kodbytt data som vi evaluerer for to språkopar: Indonesisk-engelsk og tyrkisk-tysk. For dei siste, introduserer vi novel normaliseringslag og dei tilsvarande språk-ID og POS-taggane for datasettet, og evaluerer nedstrømmeeffekten for normalisering på POS-taggane. Resultatet viser at våre CS-tilpassane normaliseringsmodular utfører betydelig monospråk, og fører til 5,4 % relativt utvikling for POS-merking som sammenlignet med uformaliserte inndata.', 'sr': 'Leksička normalizacija, prevod nekanoničkih podataka na standardni jezik, pokazao je da poboljšava učinkovitost mnogih prirodnih zadataka obrade jezika na društvenim medijima. Ipak, koristeći višestruke jezike na jednom rečenju, također se zove prebacivanje koda (CS), često pregledavaju te normalizacione sisteme, uprkos njenoj zajedničkoj upotrebi u društvenim medijima. U ovom papiru predlažemo tri modela normalizacije posebno dizajnirane da se bave podacima zamijenjenim kodom koje procjenjujemo za dva jezička parova: Indonezijski-engleski i turski-nemački. Za poslednje, predstavljamo nove normalizacije slojeve i njihove odgovarajuće jezičke identifikacije i oznake POS za setu podataka, i procjenjujemo niz uticaj normalizacije na oznake POS-a. Rezultati pokazuju da naši modeli normalizacije koji su prilagođeni CS-om značajno iznosi monojezičke, i dovede do povećanja relativne funkcije u odnosu na 5,4% za označavanje POS-a u usporedbu sa neoormalizovanim ulazom.', 'so': 'Noralsiinta Leksikal, turjumidda data-aan-canonical ah ee luqada standardka ah, waxay u muuqatay inuu hagaajiyo sameynta shaqooyin badan oo lagu baaraandegay luqada asalka ah ee ku jira shabakadda bulshada. Yet, using multiple languages in one utterance, also called code-switching (CS), is frequently overlooked by these normalization systems, despite its common use in social media.  Warqaddan waxaan ku soo jeedaynaa saddex model oo caadi ah oo si gaar ah loogu talogalay in lagu maamulo macluumaad la beddelo oo aan qiimeynayno labada labo oo luqad ah: Indonesian-Ingiriis iyo Turki-Jarmal. Marka ugu dambeyso, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa tababarka qoyska ee caadiga ah iyo aqoonsiga luqada iyo bandhigyada POS ee ku haboon, waxaana qiimeynaynaa saamaynta hoose ee caadiga ah oo ku saabsan tagging POS. Xilliyadu waxay muuqataa in qaababka caadiga ah ee CS-tailoray ay si muhiim ah u samaystaan afka monolika ah, wuxuuna keenaa 5.4% oo ku kordhiya bandhigyada POS, iyadoo la barbaranaya input aan la beddelin.', 'si': 'සාමාජික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරවෘතිකරණය, සාමාජික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරවෘතිකරණයේ සාමාජික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරවෘතිකරණය ගොඩක් වැ නමුත්, කෝඩ් ස්විච්චි කිරීම (CS) කියලා භාෂාව භාවිත කරනවා, සාමාජික මාධාරණ පද්ධතියෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය භාවිතා  මේ පැත්තට, අපි සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂයෙන් සැකසුම් මොඩේල් තුනක් සැකසුම් කරනවා විශේෂයෙන් කෝඩ් වෙනස් කරලා තියෙන්නේ කෝඩ්  අන්තිම වලින්, අපි නියම සාමාන්\u200dය ස්ථානය සහ ඔවුන්ගේ සම්බන්ධ භාෂාව ID සහ POS ටැග් සඳහා දත්ත සැට්ටුව සඳහා අවශ්\u200dය කරනවා, POS ට ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ CS-tailored සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාපනය විද්\u200dයාපනය විශේෂයෙන් එක භාෂාවක් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා කියලා, සහ POS', 'sv': 'Lexisk normalisering, översättning av icke-kanoniska data till standardspråk, har visat sig förbättra prestanda för många naturliga språkbehandlingsuppgifter på sociala medier. Ändå förbises ofta användningen av flera språk i ett yttrande, även kallad kodväxling (CS), trots dess vanliga användning i sociala medier. I denna uppsats föreslår vi tre normaliseringsmodeller speciellt utformade för att hantera kodväxlad data som vi utvärderar för två språkpar: indonesiska-engelska och turkiska-tyska. För det senare introducerar vi nya normaliseringslager och deras motsvarande språk ID och POS-taggar för datauppsättningen, och utvärderar normaliseringens nedströmseffekt på POS-taggar. Resultaten visar att våra CS-skräddarsydda normaliseringsmodeller avsevärt överträffar enspråkiga och leder till 5,4% relativ prestandaökning för POS-taggning jämfört med onormalad indata.', 'ur': 'لیکسیکل عامل کرنا، غیر کانونیک ڈاکٹوں کی ترجمہ استاندارڈ زبان میں، بہت سی طبیعی زبان پرسس کرنے کے کاموں کی عمدت کو سوسیلی میڈیا میں بہت زیادہ عمدہ کرنا دکھایا گیا ہے. لیکن ایک کلام میں بہت سی زبانوں کا استعمال کرتا ہے، کوڈ-سوچینگ (CS) کا نام بھی ہے، بہت سی حالت میں یہ عام سیستموں کے ذریعہ مغلوب ہوتا ہے، اگرچہ سوسیل میڈیا میں اس کا عام استعمال کرتا ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم تین نارمولیزی موڈل کو مخصوص طراحی کیا گیا ہے کہ کوڈ-سوئٹ ڈاٹ کے ساتھ ادارہ کریں اور ہم دو زبان جوڑوں کے لئے ارزش کریں: انڈونزی-انگلیسی اور ترکیش-جرمن۔ آخرین کے لئے ہم نئی نارمولیزی لہروں اور ان کی نسبت زبان ID اور POS ٹاگ ڈاٹسٹ کے لئے پیش کریں اور POS ٹاگ پر نارمولیزی کے نیچے اثر کا ارزش کریں. نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارے CS-tailored normalization models significantly higher than monolingual ones, and lead to 5.4% relative performance increase for POS tagging as compared to unormalized input.', 'ta': 'லெக்சிக்சியல் சாதாரண செயல்பாடு, நிலையான மொழியில் கானோனிகல் தகவல் மொழியின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு, பல இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாடுகளின்  ஆனாலும், பல மொழிகளையும் ஒரு வார்த்தையில் பயன்படுத்தி, குறிமுறைமாற்றுதல் என்றும் கூறுகிறது, இந்த வழக்கமான முறைமைகளால் பார்க்கப்படு இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட தகவலை கையாள மூன்று இயல்பான மாதிரிகளை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். இதை ந இறுதிக்கு, நாம் புதிய புதிய வழக்கமான அடுக்குகள் மற்றும் அவர்களுடைய பொருத்தமான மொழி அடையாளம் மற்றும் POS ஒட்டுகளை தரவுத்தளத்திற்கு அறிவிக முடிவு', 'vi': "Sự bình thường ngôn ngữ, dịch chuyển dữ liệu không đúng tiêu chuẩn thành ngôn ngữ tiêu chuẩn, đã cho thấy cải thiện việc thực hiện nhiều công việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên trên phương tiện xã hội. Tuy nhiên, sử dụng nhiều ngôn ngữ trong một ngôn ngữ, cũng được gọi là'chuyển đổi mã'. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất ba mô hình bình thường được thiết kế đặc biệt để xử lý dữ liệu hoán đổi mã mà chúng tôi đánh giá cho hai cặp ngôn ngữ: Indonesia-English và Thổ-Đức. Với những lớp sau, chúng ta sẽ giới thiệu các lớp bình thường mới và các thẻ nhận diện ngôn ngữ và các thẻ bưu điện tương ứng với bộ dữ liệu, và đánh giá các hiệu ứng dần của sự bình thường trên thẻ bưu điện. Kết quả cho thấy các mô hình phục hồi tổng hợp, dựa trên khả năng tổng hợp, có khả năng làm giảm ngôn ngữ, và tăng khả năng tương đối cho kết quả có thể đạt được so với kết nhập bất thường.", 'uz': "Leksikal normal tasdiqlash, kanonik maʼlumot andoza tillarda tarjima qilish, soʻzda ko'pchilik tilni boshqarish vazifalarini bajarishini bajarishini oshirish mumkin. Lekin bir so'zlar bilan bir so'zda ko'p so'zlar yordamida, kod- oʻzgartirish (CS) deb nomlanadi. Umumiy media'da umumiy foydalanishdan iborat ham ko'p oddiy foydalanadi. Bu qogʻozda biz uchta oddiylik modellarini boshqarish uchun boshqaruvchimiz. Bu ikkita tillar qoʻllari uchun biz qiymatmiz: Indonezcha- Inglizcha va Turkcha- Olmoncha. Keyingi davomida, biz yangi oddiylik qatlamni va ularning qisqa tilning ID va POS taglarini maʼlumotlar sahifaga ishlatimiz va POS yordamida oddiylik effektini qiymatimiz. Natijalar koʻrsatiladi, CS qo'llangan normalization modellarimiz monolingual o'zlarini aniqlaydi, va o'zgarishga o'xshash notoʻgʻri kiritilgan POS yorligiga 5.4% bajarish natijasini oshirish mumkin.", 'hr': 'Leksička normalizacija, prevod ne-kanoničkih podataka na standardni jezik, pokazala je da poboljšava učinkovitost mnogih prirodnih zadataka obrade jezika na društvenim medijima. Ipak, koristeći višestruke jezike u jednom govoru, također se zove prebacivanje koda (CS), često pregledavaju te normalizacijske sustave, uprkos njenoj zajedničkoj upotrebi u društvenim medijima. U ovom papiru predlažemo tri modela normalizacije posebno dizajnirane za rješavanje podataka koje smo procjenjivali za dva jezička parova: Indonezijski-engleski i turski-njemački. Za posljednje, predstavljamo novi normalizacijski slojevi i njihove odgovarajuće jezičke identifikacije i oznake POS-a za setu podataka i procjenjujemo donji učinak normalizacije na oznake POS-a. Rezultati pokazuju da naši modeli normalizacije koji su prilagođeni CS-om značajno nadmašuju monojezičke, te dovede do povećanja relativne učinkovitosti u odnosu na 5,4% za označavanje POS-a u usporedbi s neonormalizovanom ulazom.', 'da': 'Lexisk normalisering, oversættelsen af ikke-kanoniske data til standardsprog, har vist sig at forbedre udførelsen af mange naturlige sprogbehandlingsopgaver på sociale medier. Men brugen af flere sprog i én udtalelse, også kaldet kodeskift (CS), overses ofte af disse normaliseringssystemer, på trods af dets almindelige brug i sociale medier. I denne artikel foreslår vi tre normaliseringsmodeller, der er specielt designet til at håndtere kodeskiftede data, som vi evaluerer for to sprogpar: indonesisk-engelsk og tyrkisk-tysk. For sidstnævnte introducerer vi nye normaliseringslag og deres tilsvarende sprog ID og POS tags til datasættet, og evaluerer den downstream effekt af normalisering på POS tagging. Resultaterne viser, at vores CS-skræddersyede normaliseringsmodeller yder betydeligt bedre end ensprogede modeller, og fører til 5,4% relativ ydeevne stigning for POS tagging sammenlignet med umormaliseret input.', 'nl': 'Lexische normalisatie, de vertaling van niet-canonieke gegevens naar standaardtaal, heeft aangetoond de prestaties van veel natuurlijke taalverwerkingstaken op sociale media te verbeteren. Toch wordt het gebruik van meerdere talen in één uiting, ook wel code-switching (CS) genoemd, vaak over het hoofd gezien door deze normalisatiesystemen, ondanks het veelvoorkomende gebruik in sociale media. In dit artikel stellen we drie normalisatiemodellen voor die specifiek zijn ontworpen om code-switched data te verwerken die we evalueren voor twee taalparen: Indonesisch-Engels en Turks-Duits. Voor dit laatste introduceren we nieuwe normalisatielagen en hun overeenkomstige taal-ID en POS-tags voor de dataset, en evalueren we het downstream effect van normalisatie op POS-tagging. De resultaten tonen aan dat onze CS-aangepaste normalisatiemodellen aanzienlijk beter presteren dan eentalige modellen, en leiden tot 5,4% relatieve prestatieverhoging voor POS tagging in vergelijking met niet-normaliseerde invoer.', 'de': 'Lexikale Normalisierung, die Übersetzung von nicht-kanonischen Daten in Standardsprache, hat gezeigt, dass die Leistung vieler natürlicher Sprachverarbeitungsaufgaben in sozialen Medien verbessert wird. Dennoch wird die Verwendung mehrerer Sprachen in einer Äußerung, auch Code-Switching (CS) genannt, von diesen Normalisierungssystemen oft übersehen, obwohl sie in sozialen Medien häufig verwendet werden. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir drei Normalisierungsmodelle vor, die speziell für den Umgang mit kodegeschalteten Daten entwickelt wurden, die wir für zwei Sprachpaare auswerten: Indonesisch-Englisch und Türkisch-Deutsch. Für letztere führen wir neuartige Normalisierungsschichten und deren entsprechende Sprach-ID und POS-Tags für den Datensatz ein und evaluieren den nachgelagerten Effekt der Normalisierung auf POS-Tagging. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unsere CS-maßgeschneiderten Normalisierungsmodelle monolinguale Modelle deutlich übertreffen und zu 5,4% relativer Leistungssteigerung für POS-Tagging im Vergleich zu nicht normalisierten Eingaben führen.', 'id': 'Normalisasi Lexik, terjemahan data non-canonic ke bahasa standar, telah menunjukkan untuk meningkatkan prestasi banyak tugas proses bahasa alam di media sosial. Namun, menggunakan berbagai bahasa dalam satu ucapan, juga disebut code-switching (CS), sering diabaikan oleh sistem normalisasi ini, meskipun digunakan umum dalam media sosial. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan tiga model normalisasi secara khusus direncanakan untuk menangani data yang ditukar kode yang kami evaluasi untuk dua pasangan bahasa: Indonesia-Inggris dan Turki-Jerman. Untuk yang terakhir, kami memperkenalkan lapisan normalisasi baru dan ID bahasa yang sesuai dengan mereka dan tag POS untuk set data, dan mengevaluasi efek turun dari normalisasi pada tag POS. Hasil menunjukkan bahwa model normalisasi yang disesuaikan dengan CS kita jauh lebih besar dari model monobahasa, dan menyebabkan 5,4% peningkatan prestasi relatif untuk penanda POS dibandingkan dengan input tidak normal.', 'bg': 'Лексикалната нормализация, преводът на неканонични данни на стандартен език, показа, че подобрява изпълнението на много задачи по обработка на естествени езици в социалните медии. Въпреки това използването на няколко езика в една реч, наричана още кодово превключване (КС), често е пренебрегвано от тези системи за нормализиране, въпреки общото му използване в социалните медии. В настоящата статия предлагаме три модела за нормализиране, специално разработени за обработка на кодово-комутирани данни, които оценяваме за две езикови двойки: индонезийски-английски и турско-немски. За последното въвеждаме нови слоеве за нормализиране и съответните им езикови идентификационни и ПОС тагове за набора от данни и оценяваме ефекта надолу по веригата на нормализацията върху етикетирането на ПОС. Резултатите показват, че нашите модели за нормализиране значително превъзхождат монолинговите модели и водят до 5,4% относително увеличение на производителността при маркиране на ПОС в сравнение с ненормалните входове.', 'tr': 'Leksik normalizacija, kanonik gabdaly maglumatyň standart dile terjime edilen, sosial medýýalarda tebigy diller işlemegi netijesini geliştirmek üçin görkezildi. Ýöne, birnäçe diller bir dilde ullanýar, hem köd üýtgetmegi (CS) diýip atlandyrylýar. Bu normalizasyon sistemleri sosyal medýýatlarda işlenýän baýram. Bu kagyzda biz 3 düzenlemek nusgalary diňe köd almak üçin tassyklandyrylýan, iki dil çift üçin deňleýäris: Indoneziýa-iňlisçe we Türk-iňlisçe. Soňky üçin, biz romanlaryň normalizasyon katlaryny we olaryň ýaly dil ID we POS taglaryny bermek üçin taýýarlapdyr we POS taglarynda düşürmek täsirini çykýarys. Netijimler CS-lerimiziň normalizasyon nusgalarymyzyň monodillerden çykyp ýok bolandygyny görkezýär we POS-lerimiziň düzgünsiz girişi bilen görä 5.4% relative netijesi artdyrylýandygyny görkezýär.', 'fa': 'تعبیر داده های غیر کانونیک به زبان استاندارد، عملکرد بسیاری از کارهای پردازش زبان طبیعی در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی را بهتر می\u200cکند. با این حال، با استفاده از زبانهای متعدد در یک کلمه، همچنین به نام تغییر کد (CS) اغلب توسط این سیستم\u200cهای عادی، با وجود استفاده مشترک آن در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی فراموش می\u200cشود. در این کاغذ، ما سه مدل عاملی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که دقیقاً برای مدیریت داده\u200cهای تغییر داده شده\u200cاند که برای دو جفت زبان ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم: انگلیسی-انگلیسی و ترکیسی-آلمانی. برای آخرین، ما طبقه\u200cهای نویسی\u200cسازی نویسی را معرفی می\u200cکنیم و نقاشی\u200cهای زبان و نقاشی POS را برای مجموعه داده\u200cها معرفی می\u200cکنیم، و تاثیر پایین\u200cترین نویسی بر نقاشی POS را ارزیابی می\u200cکنی نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل\u200cهای عامل\u200cسازی با CS\u200cهای ما بسیار بیشتر از یک زبان\u200cها انجام می\u200cدهند، و به 5.4 درصد افزایش عملکرد نسبت به نقاشی POS در مقایسه با ورودی غیرعامل می\u200cشود.', 'ko': '어휘 규범화는 비규범 데이터를 표준 언어로 번역하는 방법으로 소셜 미디어에서 많은 자연 언어 처리 임무의 성능을 향상시킬 수 있음을 증명했다.그러나 한 언어에서 다양한 언어를 사용하는 것을 코드 변환(CS)이라고도 부른다. 소셜 미디어에서 흔히 볼 수 있지만 이런 규범화 시스템은 자주 이를 무시한다.본고에서 우리는 코드 교환 데이터를 처리하는 데 사용되는 세 가지 규범화 모델을 제시했고 인도네시아 영어와 터키 독일어 두 가지 언어를 평가했다.후자에 대해 우리는 데이터 집합을 위해 새로운 규범화층과 그에 상응하는 언어 ID와 어성 표기를 도입하고 규범화가 어성 표기에 미치는 하류의 영향을 평가했다.그 결과 우리 CS 맞춤형 규범화 모델은 단어 규범화 모델보다 현저히 우수했고 비규범화 입력에 비해 단어 표시의 상대적인 성능이 5.4% 향상되었다.', 'sw': 'Utawala wa hali ya kawaida wa Lexico, tafsiri ya taarifa zisizo za ki-Kanoni kwa lugha ya kawaida, imeonyesha kuboresha ufanisi wa kazi nyingi za utaratibu wa lugha za asili katika mitandao ya kijamii. Hata hivyo, kwa kutumia lugha mbalimbali kwa lugha moja, pia inaitwa kubadilishana kwa kodi (CS), mara nyingi hufuatiliwa na mfumo huu wa kawaida, pamoja na matumizi yake ya kawaida katika mitandao ya kijamii. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mifano mitatu ya utaratibu hususani kwa ajili ya kukabiliana na taarifa za kubadilishwa kwa ajili ya wanaume wawili wa lugha: Indonesia-Kiingereza na Kijerumani. Kwa mwisho, tunaonyesha vipande vya usalama wa riwaya na vipande vyao vya utambulisho wa lugha na viungo vyao vya POS kwa ajili ya seti za data, na kutathmini madhara ya kawaida kwenye alama za POS. Matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa mifano yetu ya utaratibu wa CS imekuwa ikifanya vizuri zaidi ya wale wa lugha za kimapenzi, na yanapelekea kuongezeka kwa asilimia 5.4 kwa ajili ya mabango ya POS kama ilivyolinganisha na input usio na mabadiliko.', 'am': 'ሌክሲካዊ ድምፅ፣ የካኖኒካዊ ዳታዎችን ለstandard ቋንቋ መተርጓም፣ በብዙ የአፍሪካዊ ቋንቋ የሥርዓት ሥራ በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ላይ እንዲያሳድግ ግለጽን አሳልፎአል፡፡ ነገር ግን በአንድ ንግግር ብዙዎችን ቋንቋዎች በመጠቀም፣ የኮድ-ተለወጥ (CS) በሚባል፣ ምንም እንኳን በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ውስጥ የተጠቃሚ የተጠቃሚ ስርዓት ምንም እንኳን በተለየ እነዚህ የተመዘዋወተኞቹ ድምፅዎች በተለየ፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ለሁለት ቋንቋዎች ሁለት ዓይነቶች እና የኢንዶንያዊ-እንግሊዘኛ እና ቱርክኛ-ጀርመን ያሉትን የኮድ-ለውጥ ዳታዎችን ለመቀበል የተለየውን ሦስት የተመዘዋወተኑን ሞዴል እናዘጋጅታለን፡፡ ለኋለኛይቱ፣ የአሁኑን መደገፊያ ደረጃዎች እና የቋንቋ ID እና የPOS ምልክቶችን ለዳታተር እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ፍጥረቶቹ የCS-tailored normalization modelማችን በሙሉ ልዩ ቋንቋዎች የበለጠ እንደሆነ ያሳየቃሉ፤ እናም ከውጤት ጋር እንደተደረገ የPOS ማተሚያ እጥፍ 5.4 በመቶ ያሳያል፡፡', 'af': 'Leksiese normalisering, die vertaling van nie-kanoniese data na standaard taal, het vertoon om die prestasie van baie natuurlike taal verwerking opdragte op sosiale media te verbeter. Maar, gebruik veelvuldige tale in een uitspraak, genoem ook kode-wisseling (CS), is dikwels oorskou deur hierdie normaliseringstelsels, veral sy gemeenskaplike gebruik in sosiale media. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons drie normaliseringmodele spesifieke ontwerp om kode-geskuif data te hanteer wat ons evalueer vir twee taal paar: Indonesiese-Engels en Turkse-Duitse. Vir die laaste, introduseer ons novel normalisering lage en hul ooreenstemmende taal ID en POS etikette vir die datastel en evalueer die onderstreem effek van normalisering op POS etiketting. Resultate wys dat ons CS-sterkte normaliseerde modele betekenlik uitvoer monolinge, en lei na 5.4% relatiewe prestasie verhoog vir POS-merking as vergelyk met onnormaliseerde invoer.', 'hy': 'Լեքսիկական նորմալիզացիան, ոչ կանոնիկ տվյալների թարգմանումը ստանդարտ լեզվին ցույց է տալիս, որ բարելավում է սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների շատ բնական լեզվի վերաբերյալ խնդիրների արտադրողությունը: Սակայն, օգտագործելով բազմաթիվ լեզուներ մեկ արտահայտությամբ, որը կոչվում է նաև կոդի փոխման (CS), հաճախ անտեսվում են այս նորմալիզացիոն համակարգերը, չնայած դրանց ընդհանուր օգտագործման սոցիալական մեդիայում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք երեք նորմալիզացիայի մոդել, որոնք մասնավորապես նախագծված են կառավարելու կոդի փոխարկվող տվյալներ, որոնք մենք գնահատում ենք երկու լեզվի զույգերի համար՝ Ինդոնեզիայի-անգլերենի և թո Վերջիններին մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր նորմալիզացիայի շերտեր և նրանց համապատասխան լեզվի ID-ն ու POS-ն տվյալների համակարգի համար, և գնահատում ենք նորմալիզացիայի հետագա ազդեցությունը POS-ի նշանների վրա: Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր CS-ով պատրաստված նորմալիզացիայի մոդելները նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում են միալեզվով մոդելները, և հանգեցնում են POS-ի նշանների հարաբերական արտադրողականության աճի 5.4 տոկոսին, համեմատած աննորմա', 'bs': 'Leksička normalizacija, prevod ne-kanoničkih podataka na standardni jezik, pokazao je da poboljšava učinkovitost mnogih prirodnih zadataka obrade jezika na društvenim medijima. Ipak, koristeći višestruke jezike u jednom govoru, također se zove prebacivanje koda (CS), često pregledavaju te normalizacijske sisteme, uprkos običnom korištenju u društvenim medijima. U ovom papiru predlažemo tri modela normalizacije koje su specifično dizajnirane za rješavanje podataka koje smo procjenjivali za dva jezička parova: Indonezijski-engleski i turski-nemački. Za poslednje, predstavljamo novi normalizaciju slojeva i njihove odgovarajuće jezičke identifikacije i oznake POS-a za setu podataka, i procjenjujemo niz uticaj normalizacije na oznake POS-a. Rezultati pokazuju da naši modeli normalizacije koji su prilagođeni CS-om značajno iznosi monojezičke, i dovede do povećanja relativne učinkovitosti u odnosu na 5,4% za označavanje POS-a u usporedbi s neonormalizovanom ulazom.', 'bn': 'সামাজিক মিডিয়ায় অনেক প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়ার কাজের কাজ উন্নত করার জন্য লেক্সিক্সিয়াল স্বাভাবিকভাবে স্বাভাবিক ভা তবে একই ভাষায় বেশ কয়েকটি ভাষা ব্যবহার করে সামাজিক মিডিয়াতে সাধারণ ব্যবহার করা সত্ত্বেও কোড-switching (সিসি) নামে অভিহিত হয়। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা তিনটি স্বাভাবিক মডেল প্রস্তাব করি যা বিশেষ করে কোড-পরিবর্তনের তথ্য সামলানোর জন্য পরিকল্পনা করা হয়েছে, যা আমরা দুই ভাষার জোড় পরবর্তীর জন্য আমরা নোভেল স্বাভাবিক ক্ষেত্র এবং তাদের সংশ্লিষ্ট ভাষা ID এবং পোস ট্যাগ ডাটাসেটের জন্য উপস্থাপন করি এবং পোস ট্যাগিং এর উপর স্বাভা ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের সিসি-টেইলরেশনের স্বাভাবিক মডেল অনেক গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভাষায় প্রকাশ করে এবং পোস ট্যাগিং এর তুলনায় ৫.', 'sq': 'Normalizimi leksikal, përkthimi i të dhënave jo-kanonike në gjuhën standard, ka treguar që përmirëson performancën e shumë detyrave natyrore të përdorimit të gjuhës në media sociale. Megjithatë, përdorimi i gjuhëve të shumta në një shprehje, të quajtur gjithashtu ndërrimi i kodeve (CS), shpesh harrohet nga këto sisteme normalizimi, pavarësisht nga përdorimi i saj i përbashkët në media sociale. Në këtë letër, propozojmë tre modele normalizimi specifikisht të dizajnuara për të trajtuar të dhënat e ndryshuara me kod që vlerësojmë për dy çifte gjuhësh: Indonezian-Anglisht dhe Turk-Gjerman. Për të fundit, ne futim shtresa të reja normalizimi dhe ID gjuhës së tyre korrespondente dhe etiketa POS për të dhënat, dhe vlerësojmë efektin poshtë të normalizimit në etiketën POS. Rezultatet tregojnë se modelet tona të normalizimit të përshtatshëm për CS-të kalojnë në mënyrë të konsiderueshme ato monogjuhësore dhe çojnë në 5.4% rritje të performancës relative për etiketat POS krahasuar me input të pazakonshëm.', 'ca': "La normalització lexical, la traducció de dades no canòniques a llenguatge standard, ha demostrat millorar el desempeny de moltes tasques naturals de processament de llenguatges als mitjans socials. Però utilitzar múltiples llengües en una sola expressió, també anomenada canvi de codi (CS), és sovint ignorat per aquests sistemes de normalització, malgrat la seva utilització comú als mitjans socials. En aquest paper, proposem tres models de normalització dissenyats específicament per manejar dades canviades de codi que evaluem per dos parells de llenguatges: Indonèsia-anglès i turco-alemany. Per a aquesta última, introduïm noves caps de normalització i les seves etiquetes d'identificació de llenguatge i POS correspondents per al conjunt de dades, i evaluem l'efecte avall de la normalització en l'etiqueta POS. Els resultats mostren que els nostres models de normalització adaptats a la CS superen significativament els monolingües, i portan a un increment de rendiment relativ del 5,4% en la etiqueta POS comparat amb la entrada no normalitzada.", 'cs': 'Lexikální normalizace, překlad nekanonických dat do standardního jazyka, ukázalo, že zlepšuje výkon mnoha úloh zpracování přirozeného jazyka na sociálních médiích. Přesto používání více jazyků v jednom projevu, také nazývané kódové přepínání (CS), je těmito normalizačními systémy často přehlíženo, navzdory běžnému používání v sociálních médiích. V tomto článku navrhujeme tři normalizační modely speciálně navržené pro zpracování kódově přepínaných dat, které vyhodnocujeme pro dva jazykové páry: indonéština-angličtina a turecko-němčina. Pro druhé představujeme nové normalizační vrstvy a jejich odpovídající jazykové ID a POS tagy pro datovou sadu a vyhodnocujeme následný efekt normalizace na POS tagování. Výsledky ukazují, že naše CS-šité normalizační modely výrazně překonávají monojazyčné modely a vedou k 5,4% relativnímu zvýšení výkonu pro POS tagování ve srovnání s neonormalizovaným vstupem.', 'az': 'Leksik normalizasyon, kanonik olmayan məlumatların standart dilinə çevirilməsi, sosyal medya vasitələrində çox təbiətli dil işləmə işlərinin performansını yaxşılaşdırmağını göstərdi. Halbuki, bir sözlərdə çoxlu dilləri istifadə edərək, kodu değiştirmək (CS) adlandırılır, bu normalizasyon sistemləri çoxlu dəyişiklik edər, sosyal medya vasitəsində istifadə edilməsinə rağmen. Bu kağızda, iki dil çiftə değerlendirmək üçün müəyyən edilmiş üç normalizasyon modeli təklif edirik: Indoneziya-İngilizə və Türk-Almanca. Sonrakılar üçün yeni normalizasyon katlarını və məlumat qutusu üçün onların uyğun dil ID və POS etiketlərini təşkil edirik və POS etiketlərində normalizasyonun aşağı təsirini değerləşdiririk. Sonuçlarımız CS-dən düzəldilən normalizasyon modellərimizin monodil modellərindən daha çox üstün olduğunu göstərir, və POS etiketlərini normalizasyonsuz giriş ilə salınması üçün 5.4%-in qohum performans artırmağını göstərir.', 'fi': 'Lexical normalisointi, ei-kanonisten tietojen kääntäminen standardikielelle, on osoittanut parantavansa monien luonnollisten kielten käsittelytehtävien suorituskykyä sosiaalisessa mediassa. Kuitenkin useiden kielten käyttö yhdessä lauseessa, jota kutsutaan myös koodinvaihtoksi (CS), jää usein näiden normalisointijärjestelmien huomiotta huolimatta siitä, että sitä käytetään yleisesti sosiaalisessa mediassa. Tässä työssä ehdotamme kolmea standardisointimallia, jotka on suunniteltu käsittelemään koodinvaihtoisia tietoja, joita arvioimme kahdelle kieliparille: indonesia-englanti ja turkki-saksa. Jälkimmäisessä esitellään aineistolle uusia normalisointitasoja ja niitä vastaavia kielitunnisteita ja POS-tunnisteita sekä arvioidaan normalisoinnin loppupään vaikutusta POS-tunnisteisiin. Tulokset osoittavat, että CS-räätälöidyt normalisointimallimme suoriutuvat huomattavasti monikielisistä malleista ja johtavat 5,4%:n suhteelliseen suorituskykyyn POS-tagauksessa verrattuna normalisoimattomaan syötteeseen.', 'et': 'Lexikaalne normaliseerimine, mittekooniliste andmete tõlkimine standardkeelde, on näidanud, et paljude looduskeele töötlemise ülesannete tulemuslikkus sotsiaalmeedias on paranenud. Samas jätavad need normaliseerimissüsteemid sageli tähelepanuta mitme keele kasutamist ühes väljendis, mida nimetatakse ka koodivahetuseks (CS), hoolimata selle levinud kasutamisest sotsiaalmeedias. Käesolevas töös pakume välja kolm normaliseerimismudelit, mis on spetsiaalselt loodud koodiga vahetatud andmete käsitlemiseks, mida hindame kahe keelepaari jaoks: indoneesia-inglise ja türgi-saksa. Viimase puhul tutvustame andmekogumile uudseid normaliseerimiskihiid ja nende vastavaid keele ID- ja POS-silte ning hindame normaliseerimise järgnevat mõju POS-sildistamisele. Tulemused näitavad, et meie CS-kohandatud normaliseerimismudelid ületavad oluliselt ühekeelseid mudeleid ja toovad kaasa 5,4% suhtelise jõudluse kasvu POS-märgistamisel võrreldes normaliseerimata sisendiga.', 'jv': 'Name politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang pepulan iki, kita suggeru model Normal sithik kanggo disenyong nggambar kode-bisa data sing apik dhéwé nyimpen kanggo masara urip durung: Inggris-Inggris karo turk-aleman. Nyong ngomong kamuh, kita nganggep ngetoke Normalisi alam sing nganggep nggambar kelas ID lan potS sing dumadhi kanggo dataset measurement', 'ha': "@ label: listbox Babu da haka, ana yi amfani da wasu harshe masu yawa cikin magana guda, kuma yana kiran kodi-mai musanya (SA), ana ƙarfafa shi da wasu na'urar shiryarwa ko da yawa, kuma ingawa yã yi amfani da shi a cikin mita jamii. Daga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa misãlai uku masu normal da aka ƙayyade wajen ka yi amfani da data masu shige kodi da za'a qiimata ga sauri biyu cikin harshen: Indonesian-Ingiriya da tsuruki-jeron. For the latter, we introduce novel normalization layers and their corresponding language ID and POS tags for the dataset, and evaluate the downstream effect of normalization on POS tagging.  Natamata ke nuna cewa misalin shiryoyinmu na samar da SA-tailinta mai significant ko da wasu na'urar ayuka na zama, kuma yana ƙara wa tarawa 5.4% da ya danganta ga tagogi ga PSS kamar da ya sami da injistan da ba'a zartar da shi ba.", 'sk': 'Lexična normalizacija, prevod nekonskih podatkov v standardni jezik, je pokazala, da izboljšuje uspešnost številnih nalog obdelave naravnega jezika na družbenih omrežjih. Vendar pa so ti sistemi normalizacije pogosto spregledali uporabo več jezikov v enem izgovoru, imenovani tudi preklapljanje kod (CS). V prispevku predlagamo tri modele normalizacije, ki so posebej oblikovani za obdelavo podatkov s preklopom kod, ki jih ocenjujemo za dva jezikovna para: indonezijsko-angleščino in turško-nemščino. Za slednje uvajamo nove plasti normalizacije in njihove ustrezne oznake ID jezika in POS za nabor podatkov ter ocenimo nadaljnji učinek normalizacije na označevanje POS. Rezultati kažejo, da so naši CS-prilagojeni modeli normalizacije bistveno boljši od enojezičnih modelov in povzročijo 5,4% relativno povečanje zmogljivosti označevanja POS v primerjavi z nenormaliziranim vnosom.', 'bo': 'གནད་དོན་མི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་བཟོ་བྱས་ན། རྣམ་གྲངས་མིན་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག ཡིན་ནའང་། སྐད་རིགས་གཅིག་ནང་དུ་སྐད་ཡིག་མང་པོ་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱོད་ཀྱིས་kod-switching(CS)ཟེར་ན། In this paper, we propose three normalization models specifically designed to handle code-switched data which we evaluate for two language pairs: Indonesian-English and Turkish-German. འཛམ་གླིང་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྗེས་སུ་ང་ཚོས་གསར་བ་བཟོ་བའི་བང་རིམ་དང་ཁོ་ཚོའི་ཆ་མཚུངས་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་CS ལྟ་བུའི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་གཅིག་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ཕན་ཐོགས་ཏེ།', 'he': 'Lexical normalization, the translation of non-canonical data to standard language, has shown to improve the performance of many natural language processing tasks on social media.  Yet, using multiple languages in one utterance, also called code-switching (CS), is frequently overlooked by these normalization systems, despite its common use in social media.  In this paper, we propose three normalization models specifically designed to handle code-switched data which we evaluate for two language pairs: Indonesian-English and Turkish-German.  עבור האחרון, אנו מכירים שכבות נורמליזציה חדשות וכתובות השפה המתאימות שלהם וכתובות POS עבור קבוצת המידע, ולעריך את ההשפעה המאוחרת של נורמליזציה על תגים POS. Results show that our CS-tailored normalization models significantly outperform monolingual ones, and lead to 5.4% relative performance increase for POS tagging as compared to unnormalized input.'}
{'en': 'Structural Encoding and Pre-training Matter : Adapting BERT for Table-Based Fact Verification', 'ar': 'الترميز الهيكلي ومسألة ما قبل التدريب: تكييف BERT للتحقق من صحة البيانات المستندة إلى الجدول', 'fr': 'Encodage structurel et matière de pré-apprentissage\xa0: adaptation du BERT pour la vérification des faits basée sur des tables', 'es': 'La codificación estructural y la preformación son importantes: adaptación de BERT para la verificación de hechos basada en tablas', 'pt': 'Codificação Estrutural e Matéria Pré-treinamento: Adaptando o BERT para Verificação de Fatos Baseada em Tabela', 'ja': '構造エンコーディングと事前トレーニング事項：テーブルベースの事実検証のためのBERTの適応', 'ru': 'Структурное кодирование и предварительное обучение: адаптация BERT для проверки фактов на основе таблиц', 'zh': '构编码预训练甚重,使 BERT 应表之验也', 'hi': 'संरचनात्मक एन्कोडिंग और पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण मामला: तालिका-आधारित तथ्य सत्यापन के लिए BERT को अनुकूलित करना', 'ga': 'Ionchódú Struchtúrtha agus Ábhar Réamhoiliúint: BERT a Chur in oiriúint do Fhíorú Fíricí Tábla', 'ka': 'სტრუქტურალური კოდირება და საინტერექტირება მატერია: BERT-ის აეპორტირება ცხრილის ბაზეული ფაქტის შემოწმება', 'hu': 'Strukturális kódolás és képzés előtti kérdés: a BERT alkalmazása a táblázatalapú tények ellenőrzéséhez', 'el': 'Διαρθρωτική κωδικοποίηση και προεκπαίδευση: Προσαρμογή του BERT για επαλήθευση γεγονότων βάσει πίνακα', 'it': 'Crittografia strutturale e pre-formazione: adattare BERT alla verifica dei fatti basata su tabelle', 'lt': 'Struktūrinis kodavimas ir parengiamasis mokymas', 'kk': 'Структуралық кодтамасы және алдындағы оқыту материалы: кесте негізіндегі факттерді тексеру үшін BERT баптауы', 'mk': 'Структурно кодирање и предобука', 'ml': 'സ്ട്രാക്ട്രിക്കല്\u200d എന്\u200dകോഡിങ്ങും പരിശീലനത്തിനുമുമ്പ് പരിശീലനത്തിനുമുള്ള കാര്യം: ടേബിള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഫക്റ', 'ms': 'Pengekodan Struktur dan Sasaran Pra-pelatihan: Menyesuaikan BERT untuk Pengesahan Fakta Berasas Jadual', 'mt': 'Kwistjoni ta’ Kodifikazzjoni Strutturali u ta’ Qabel it-Taħriġ: Adattament tal-BERT għall-Verifika tal-Fatti bbażata fuq it-Tabella', 'mn': 'Структураллын кодлог болон урд сургалтын асуудал: Хүснэгтийн үндсэн шалгалтын BERT-г засах', 'no': 'Strukturiske koding og føreøvingsMatter: Tilpassar BERT for tabellbasert faktiskverifikasjon', 'ro': 'Probleme de codificare structurală și pre-formare: adaptarea BERT pentru verificarea faptelor bazate pe tabel', 'pl': 'Kwestia kodowania strukturalnego i przedszkolenia: dostosowanie BERT do weryfikacji faktów opartych na tabeli', 'so': 'Heshiiska kooban iyo waxbarashada horumarinta: Adapting BERT for Table-Based Verification', 'si': 'සංවිධානය සංකේතනය සහ ප්\u200dරධානය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්: විස්තර පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා BERT අනුමාණය කරන්න', 'sv': 'Strukturkodning och förberedelse: Anpassning av BERT för tabellbaserad faktakontroll', 'sr': 'Strukturalna kodiranja i predobuka materija: prilagođenje BERT za provjeru činjenica na tabli', 'ta': 'அட்டவணை அடிப்படையில் அடிப்படை', 'ur': 'Structural Encoding and Pre-training Matter: Adapting BERT for Table-Based Fact Verification', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Kiến trúc bao tải và vật liệu trước giáo dục:', 'bg': 'Структурно кодиране и предобучение: адаптиране на BERT за проверка на фактите въз основа на таблица', 'nl': 'Structurele codering en pre-training: BERT aanpassen voor tabelgebaseerde feitenverificatie', 'hr': 'Strukturalna kodiranja i predobuka materija: prilagođenje BERT za provjeru činjenica na tabli', 'da': 'Strukturkodning og forberedelse af træning: Tilpasning af BERT til tabelbaseret verifikation af fakta', 'de': 'Strukturelle Codierung und Vortraining: Anpassung von BERT an tabellenbasierte Faktenverifizierung', 'id': 'Pengekodan Struktur dan Perlatihan Materi: Menyesuaikan BERT untuk Pemeriksaan Fakta Berdasarkan Tabel', 'fa': 'رمزبندی ساختاری و موضوع پیش آموزش: تغییر دادن BERT برای بررسی حقیقت بنیاد میز', 'tr': 'struktural Ködleme we Öňki öňki Görniş Opşenler: BERT Taýtable-Based Fact Verification üçin Äplikeýmek', 'ko': '패브릭 코딩 및 사전 트레이닝 사항: 표 기반 사실 검증에 BERT 적용', 'sw': 'Ujumbe wa Miundombinu na Matukio ya Kitaarifa cha Tamko: Kupitia Uchunguzi wa BERT', 'af': 'Struktuurale enkodering en vooraf- oefening Matte: Aanpassering BERT vir Tabel- Baseerde Faktoverifikasie', 'am': 'መግለጫ', 'sq': 'Kodifikimi strukturor dhe çështja e paratrajnimit: Adaptimi i BERT për verifikimin e fakteve bazuar në tabelë', 'hy': 'Տեռուցվածքային կոդավորումը և նախապատրաստման նյութ. սեղանի վրա հիմնված փաստերի ստուգումների BER-ի հարմարեցման', 'az': 'Struktural Kodlama v톛 톛vv톛l t톛hsil Mal캼', 'bs': 'Strukturalna kodiranja i predobuka materija: prilagođenje BERT za provjeru činjenica na tabli', 'ca': 'Codificació estructural i pregunta: Adaptar el BERT a la verificació de fets basada en la taula', 'bn': 'কাঠামোরিক এনকোডিং এবং পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষণের ব্যাপার: টেবিল-ভিত্তিক ফ্যাক্ট সংক্রান্ত সংস্করণে', 'cs': 'Záležitost strukturálního kódování a předškolení: adaptace BERT pro ověřování faktů na základě tabulky', 'et': 'Struktuuriline kodeerimine ja koolituseelne küsimus: BERT kohandamine tabelipõhiseks faktide kontrollimiseks', 'fi': 'Rakenteellinen koodaus ja esikoulutus: BERT:n mukauttaminen taulukkopohjaiseen faktojen todentamiseen', 'jv': 'structural', 'he': 'קוד מבנה ואימון קדמי נושא: התאמה של BERT לבדיקה עובדות מבוססת על שולחן', 'sk': 'Strukturno kodiranje in predusposabljanje: prilagajanje BERT za preverjanje dejstev na podlagi tabele', 'ha': 'Structural Encoding and Pre-training Matter: Adapting BERT for Table-Based Fact Verification', 'bo': 'Structural Encoding and Pre-training Matter: Adapting BERT for Table-Based Fact Verification'}
{'en': 'Growing concern with online misinformation has encouraged NLP research on fact verification. Since writers often base their assertions on structured data, we focus here on verifying textual statements given evidence in tables. Starting from the Table Parsing (TAPAS) model developed for question answering (Herzig et al., 2020), we find that modeling table structure improves a language model pre-trained on unstructured text. Pre-training language models on English Wikipedia table data further improves performance. Pre-training on a question answering task with column-level cell rank information achieves the best performance. With improved pre-training and cell embeddings, this approach outperforms the state-of-the-art Numerically-aware Graph Neural Network table fact verification model (GNN-TabFact), increasing statement classification accuracy from 72.2 % to 73.9 % even without modeling numerical information. Incorporating numerical information with cell rankings and pre-training on a question-answering task increases accuracy to 76 %. We further analyze accuracy on statements implicating single rows or multiple rows and columns of tables, on different numerical reasoning subtasks, and on generalizing to detecting errors in statements derived from the ToTTo table-to-text generation dataset.', 'ar': 'شجع القلق المتزايد بشأن المعلومات الخاطئة عبر الإنترنت إجراء أبحاث البرمجة اللغوية العصبية حول التحقق من الحقائق. نظرًا لأن الكتاب غالبًا ما يعتمدون في تأكيداتهم على البيانات المنظمة ، فإننا نركز هنا على التحقق من العبارات النصية الواردة في الأدلة. بدءًا من نموذج تحليل الجدول (TAPAS) الذي تم تطويره للإجابة على الأسئلة (Herzig et al. ، 2020) ، وجدنا أن بنية جدول النمذجة تحسن نموذجًا لغويًا تم تدريبه مسبقًا على نص غير منظم. تعمل نماذج اللغة قبل التدريب على بيانات جدول ويكيبيديا الإنجليزية على تحسين الأداء. يحقق التدريب المسبق على مهمة الإجابة على السؤال باستخدام معلومات ترتيب الخلية على مستوى العمود أفضل أداء. من خلال التدريب المسبق المحسّن ودمج الخلايا ، يتفوق هذا النهج على أحدث نموذج للتحقق من صحة جدول الشبكة العصبية للشبكة العصبية المدرك عدديًا (GNN-TabFact) ، مما يزيد من دقة تصنيف البيان من 72.2٪ إلى 73.9٪ حتى بدون النمذجة العددية معلومة. يؤدي دمج المعلومات الرقمية مع تصنيفات الخلايا والتدريب المسبق على مهمة الإجابة على الأسئلة إلى زيادة الدقة إلى 76٪. نقوم أيضًا بتحليل الدقة في العبارات التي تتضمن صفوفًا مفردة أو صفوفًا وأعمدة متعددة من الجداول ، وفي مهام فرعية للتفكير الرقمي المختلفة ، وفي التعميم على اكتشاف الأخطاء في العبارات المشتقة من مجموعة بيانات إنشاء جدول إلى نص ToTTo.', 'es': 'La creciente preocupación por la desinformación en línea ha fomentado la investigación de la PNL sobre verificación de hechos Dado que los escritores a menudo basan sus afirmaciones en datos estructurados, nos centramos aquí en verificar las declaraciones textuales que se muestran en tablas. Partiendo del modelo Table Parsing (TAPAS) desarrollado para responder preguntas (Herzig et al., 2020), descubrimos que el modelado de la estructura de tablas mejora un modelo de lenguaje previamente entrenado en texto no estructurado. El entrenamiento previo de modelos lingüísticos en los datos de tablas de Wikipedia en inglés mejora aún más El entrenamiento previo en una tarea de respuesta a preguntas con información de rango de celda a nivel de columna logra el mejor rendimiento. Con un preentrenamiento mejorado y la incorporación de celdas, este enfoque supera al modelo de verificación de hechos de tablas de redes neuronales de grafos con reconocimiento numérico (GNN-TabFact) de última generación, lo que aumenta la precisión de la clasificación de las declaraciones del 72,2% al 73,9% incluso sin modelar información numérica. La incorporación de información numérica con la clasificación de celdas y la capacitación previa en una tarea de respuesta a preguntas aumenta la precisión en un 76%. Además, analizamos la precisión de las declaraciones que implican filas individuales o múltiples filas y columnas de tablas, en diferentes subtareas de razonamiento numérico y en la generalización para detectar errores en las declaraciones derivadas del conjunto de datos de generación de tablas a texto TotTo.', 'pt': 'A crescente preocupação com a desinformação online encorajou a pesquisa de PNL sobre verificação de fatos. Como os escritores geralmente baseiam suas afirmações em dados estruturados, nos concentramos aqui na verificação de declarações textuais com evidências em tabelas. A partir do modelo Table Parsing (TAPAS) desenvolvido para resposta a perguntas (Herzig et al., 2020), descobrimos que a modelagem da estrutura da tabela melhora um modelo de linguagem pré-treinado em texto não estruturado. Modelos de linguagem de pré-treinamento em dados de tabela da Wikipedia em inglês melhoram ainda mais o desempenho. O pré-treinamento em uma tarefa de resposta a perguntas com informações de classificação de célula em nível de coluna alcança o melhor desempenho. Com pré-treinamento aprimorado e embeddings de células, essa abordagem supera o modelo de verificação de fatos de tabela de rede neural de gráfico com reconhecimento numérico de última geração (GNN-TabFact), aumentando a precisão da classificação de declarações de 72,2% para 73,9%, mesmo sem modelagem numérica em formação. A incorporação de informações numéricas com classificações de células e pré-treinamento em uma tarefa de resposta a perguntas aumenta a precisão para 76%. Analisamos ainda a precisão em declarações que implicam linhas únicas ou várias linhas e colunas de tabelas, em diferentes subtarefas de raciocínio numérico e na generalização para detectar erros em declarações derivadas do conjunto de dados de geração de tabela para texto ToTTo.', 'fr': "L'inquiétude croissante suscitée par la désinformation en ligne a encouragé la recherche en PNL sur la vérification des faits Puisque les rédacteurs fondent souvent leurs affirmations sur des données structurées, nous nous concentrons ici sur la vérification des déclarations textuelles présentées dans des tableaux. À partir du modèle d'analyse de table (TAPAS) développé pour répondre aux questions (Herzig et al., 2020), nous constatons que la modélisation de la structure de table améliore un modèle de langage pré-entraîné sur du texte non structuré. Les modèles linguistiques de pré-entraînement sur les données des tableaux Wikipédia anglais améliorent encore les performances. La formation préalable à une tâche de réponse à une question avec des informations de classement de cellule au niveau de la colonne permet d'obtenir les meilleures performances. Grâce à l'amélioration de la pré-formation et de l'intégration des cellules, cette approche surpasse le modèle de vérification des faits de table de réseau neuronal graphique à reconnaissance numérique (GNN-TabFACT) de pointe, augmentant la précision de classification des déclarations de 72,2\xa0% à 73,9\xa0%, même sans modéliser les informations numériques. L'intégration d'informations numériques au classement des cellules et à la formation préalable à une tâche de réponse à une question augmente la précision à 76\xa0%. Nous analysons en outre la précision des instructions impliquant des lignes uniques ou plusieurs lignes et colonnes de tables, sur différentes sous-tâches de raisonnement numérique, et sur la généralisation à la détection d'erreurs dans les instructions dérivées de l'ensemble de données de génération table-texte ToTto.", 'ja': 'オンラインの誤った情報に対する懸念の高まりは、事実検証に関するNLPの研究を奨励しています。 ライターはしばしば構造化されたデータに基づいて主張するため、ここでは表に示されたエビデンスを検証することに焦点を当てています。 質問回答のために開発されたテーブルパーシング（ TAPAS ）モデル（ Herzig et al., 2020 ）から始まり、モデリングテーブル構造は、非構造化テキストで事前にトレーニングされた言語モデルを改善することがわかります。 英語Wikipediaテーブルデータに基づいた言語モデルの事前トレーニングは、パフォーマンスをさらに向上させます。 列レベルのセルランク情報を使用した質問回答タスクの事前トレーニングは、最高のパフォーマンスを達成します。 プレトレーニングとセル埋め込みの改善により、このアプローチは最先端の数値認識グラフニューラルネットワークテーブルファクト検証モデル（ GNN - TabFact ）を上回り、数値情報をモデリングしなくてもステートメント分類の精度を72.2 ％から73.9 ％に向上させます。 数値情報をセルランキングに組み込み、質問に答えるタスクの事前トレーニングを行うと、精度が76 ％に向上します。 さらに、テーブルの単一の行または複数の行と列を含むステートメント、異なる数値推論サブタスク、ToTToテーブルからテキストへの生成データセットに由来するステートメント内のエラーを検出するための一般化の精度を分析します。', 'zh': '在线错误信息日益劝NLP验事实。 常以断言基于结构化数,故专注验表格给定证据之本。 自问答之表解析(TAPAS)始(Herzig等,2020)见建模表结构,预为非结构化之语。 英语维基百科表格数豫训言模可进一步提高性。 以列级单元格名信对问答之任,预练可获得最佳性。 改进之预练单元格嵌,其法优于最先进之数感知图神经网络表事验模(GNN-TabFact),虽不建模数息,亦能以语句之类准确率自72.2%至73.9%。 以数信合单元格名,预训练问答,准确率至 76%。 臣等更论单行多行、多列表语句、异数推理及推广检测自 ToTTo 表到文本生数集派生之谬准确性。', 'hi': 'ऑनलाइन गलत जानकारी के साथ बढ़ती चिंता ने तथ्य सत्यापन पर एनएलपी अनुसंधान को प्रोत्साहित किया है। चूंकि लेखक अक्सर संरचित डेटा पर अपने दावों को आधार बनाते हैं, इसलिए हम यहां तालिकाओं में दिए गए सबूतों को सत्यापित करने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। प्रश्न का उत्तर देने के लिए विकसित टेबल पार्सिंग (TAPAS) मॉडल (Herzig et al., 2020) से शुरू करते हुए, हम पाते हैं कि मॉडलिंग टेबल संरचना असंरचित पाठ पर पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल में सुधार करती है। अंग्रेजी विकिपीडिया तालिका डेटा पर पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण भाषा मॉडल आगे प्रदर्शन में सुधार करता है। स्तंभ-स्तरीय कक्ष रैंक जानकारी के साथ प्रश्न का उत्तर देने वाले कार्य पर पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण सर्वोत्तम प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है. बेहतर पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण और सेल एम्बेडिंग के साथ, यह दृष्टिकोण अत्याधुनिक संख्यात्मक रूप से जागरूक ग्राफ न्यूरल नेटवर्क टेबल फैक्ट वेरिफिकेशन मॉडल (GNN-TabFact) को मात देता है, यहां तक कि संख्यात्मक जानकारी के मॉडलिंग के बिना भी 72.2% से 73.9% तक बयान वर्गीकरण सटीकता को बढ़ाता है। एक प्रश्न-उत्तर देने वाले कार्य पर सेल रैंकिंग और पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण के साथ संख्यात्मक जानकारी को शामिल करने से सटीकता 76% तक बढ़ जाती है। हम आगे एकल पंक्तियों या एकाधिक पंक्तियों और तालिकाओं के स्तंभों को फंसाने वाले बयानों पर सटीकता का विश्लेषण करते हैं, विभिन्न संख्यात्मक तर्क उप-कार्यों पर, और ToTTo तालिका-से-पाठ पीढ़ी डेटासेट से व्युत्पन्न कथनों में त्रुटियों का पता लगाने के लिए सामान्यीकरण पर।', 'ru': 'Растущая озабоченность дезинформацией в Интернете поощряет исследования NLP по проверке фактов. Поскольку авторы часто основывают свои утверждения на структурированных данных, мы сосредоточимся здесь на проверке текстовых утверждений, приведенных в таблицах. Начиная с модели анализа таблиц (TAPAS), разработанной для ответов на вопросы (Herzig et al., 2020), мы обнаружили, что структура таблицы моделирования улучшает языковую модель, предварительно обученную на неструктурированном тексте. Предварительное обучение языковым моделям на основе табличных данных английской Википедии еще больше повышает производительность. Предварительное обучение по задаче ответа на вопрос с информацией о рангах ячеек на уровне столбцов обеспечивает наилучшую производительность. При улучшенном предварительном обучении и внедрении ячеек, этот подход превосходит современную модель проверки фактов в нейронной сети с числовым распознаванием (GNN-TabFact), повышая точность классификации утверждений с 72,2% до 73,9% даже без моделирования численной информации. Включение числовой информации с ранжированием по ячейкам и предварительное обучение по задаче с ответом на вопросы повышает точность до 76%. Далее мы анализируем точность по утверждениям, включающим одну строку или несколько строк и столбцов таблиц, по различным числовым подзадачам аргументации и по обобщению для обнаружения ошибок в утверждениях, полученных из набора данных генерации от таблицы к тексту ToTTo.', 'ga': 'Spreag imní mhéadaitheach maidir le faisnéis mhícheart ar líne taighde NLP ar fhíorú fíricí. Ós rud é go mbunaíonn scríbhneoirí a ndearbhuithe go minic ar shonraí struchtúrtha, dírímid anseo ar ráitis théacsúla a fhíorú a thugtar fianaise i dtáblaí. Ag tosú leis an tsamhail Parsáil Tábla (TAPAS) a forbraíodh le haghaidh freagra ceisteanna (Herzig et al., 2020), feicimid go bhfeabhsaítear struchtúr tábla samhaltaithe múnla teanga atá réamh-oilte ar théacs neamhstruchtúrtha. Feabhsaítear feidhmíocht a thuilleadh ag samhlacha teanga réamh-oiliúna ar shonraí tábla Vicipéid an Bhéarla. Baintear an fheidhmíocht is fearr amach le réamhoiliúint ar thasc freagartha ceisteanna le heolas ar chéimeanna colúin ar leibhéal na cille. Le réamhoiliúint fheabhsaithe agus leabú cille, sáraíonn an cur chuige seo an tsamhail fíoraithe fíoras tábla Graf Neural Network (GNN-TabFact) atá ar eolas go huimhriúil, ag méadú cruinneas aicmithe ráitis ó 72.2% go 73.9% fiú gan samhaltú uimhriúil. eolas. Méadaítear cruinneas go 76% trí fhaisnéis uimhriúil a ionchorprú le rangú cille agus réamhoiliúint ar thasc freagra ceiste. Déanaimid anailís bhreise ar chruinneas ar ráitis a bhaineann le sraitheanna singil nó sraitheanna iolracha agus colúin táblaí, ar fhotascanna éagsúla réasúnaíochta uimhriúla, agus ar ghinearálú chun earráidí a bhrath i ráitis a dhíorthaítear ó thacar sonraí giniúna tábla-go-téacs ToTTo.', 'hu': 'Az online téves tájékoztatással kapcsolatos növekvő aggodalom ösztönözte a tények ellenőrzésével kapcsolatos NLP-kutatásokat. Mivel az írók gyakran strukturált adatokra alapozzák állításaikat, itt a táblázatokban bizonyított szöveges állítások ellenőrzésére összpontosítunk. A kérdések megválaszolására kifejlesztett TAPAS modellből (Herzig et al., 2020) kiindulva úgy találjuk, hogy a táblázatszerkezet modellezése javítja a strukturálatlan szövegre előre kiképzett nyelvi modellt. Az angol Wikipédia táblázatadatainak előkészítése tovább javítja a teljesítményt. A kérdésre adott feladat oszlopszintű sejtranginformációkkal történő előkészítése a legjobb teljesítményt biztosítja. A továbbfejlesztett előképzéssel és sejtbeágyazással ez a megközelítés felülmúlja a legkorszerűbb numerikailag ismert Graph Neural Network tény-ellenőrzési modellt (GNN-TabFact), ami 72,2%-ról 73,9%-ra növeli a kijelentések osztályozási pontosságát még numerikus információk modellezése nélkül is. A numerikus információk beépítése sejtrangsorolással és előkészítéssel egy kérdésre válaszoló feladatban 76%-ra növeli a pontosságot. Továbbá elemezzük az egyes sorokat vagy több sort és oszlopot magában foglaló állítások pontosságát, a különböző numerikus érvelési részfeladatokat, valamint a ToTTO táblázat-szöveg generálásából származó állítások hibáinak felismerését.', 'el': 'Η αυξανόμενη ανησυχία για την παραπληροφόρηση στο διαδίκτυο έχει ενθαρρύνει την έρευνα του NLP σχετικά με την επαλήθευση γεγονότων. Δεδομένου ότι οι συγγραφείς συχνά στηρίζουν τους ισχυρισμούς τους σε δομημένα δεδομένα, εστιάζουμε εδώ στην επαλήθευση των γραπτών δηλώσεων που παρέχονται σε πίνακες. Ξεκινώντας από το μοντέλο ανάλυσης πίνακα (TAPAS) που αναπτύχθηκε για την απάντηση ερωτήσεων (κ.α., 2020), διαπιστώνουμε ότι η μοντελοποίηση της δομής πίνακα βελτιώνει ένα γλωσσικό μοντέλο προ-εκπαιδευμένο σε μη δομημένο κείμενο. Τα μοντέλα γλώσσας προεκπαίδευσης σε δεδομένα πίνακα της Αγγλικής Βικιπαίδειας βελτιώνουν περαιτέρω την απόδοση. Η προεκπαίδευση σε μια εργασία απάντησης σε ερωτήσεις με πληροφορίες βαθμού κελιών σε επίπεδο στήλης επιτυγχάνει την καλύτερη απόδοση. Με βελτιωμένη προεκπαίδευση και ενσωμάτωση κυττάρων, αυτή η προσέγγιση ξεπερνά το υπερσύγχρονο μοντέλο επαλήθευσης δεδομένων πίνακα νευρωνικού δικτύου αριθμητικής γνώσης γραφήματος (αυξάνοντας την ακρίβεια ταξινόμησης δηλώσεων από 72.2% έως 73.9% ακόμη και χωρίς μοντελοποίηση αριθμητικών πληροφοριών. Η ενσωμάτωση αριθμητικών πληροφοριών με τις βαθμολογίες κυττάρων και η προεκπαίδευση σε μια εργασία απάντησης σε ερωτήσεις αυξάνει την ακρίβεια στα 76%. Αναλύουμε περαιτέρω την ακρίβεια σε δηλώσεις που εμπλέκουν μεμονωμένες γραμμές ή πολλαπλές γραμμές και στήλες πινάκων, σε διαφορετικές δευτερεύουσες εργασίες αριθμητικού συλλογισμού και στη γενίκευση στην ανίχνευση σφαλμάτων σε δηλώσεις που προέρχονται από το σύνολο δεδομένων δημιουργίας πίνακα-κειμένου.', 'ka': 'შეცდომარება ინტერნეტის შეცდომარებისთვის გახდება NLP შესწავლობას ფაქტის შემოწმებაზე. ჩვენ აქ სტრუქტურებული მონაცემების შესახებ ტექსტურული გამოცემების შესახებ, რომელიც საკუთარი მონაცემების შესახებ. ჩვენ ვიღებთ, რომ მაგილის სტრუქტურაციის სტრუქტურაციის მოდელი უფრო უფრო აკეთება ენის მოდელი, რომელიც არ აკეთებული ტექსტურაციის შესაბამისათვის განვითარებულია. საინგლისო ვიკიპედიაში წინ განაკეთებული ენის მოდელები უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო მუშაობს. პირველ განათლება კითხვის გასაღებისთვის, რომელიც სვეტი-დონის უჯრედების ინფორმაცია უჯრედების უფრო საკეთესო პროცესტის შესაძლებელია უფრო უფრო მეტად განაცემის და უჯრედების შემდეგ, ეს პროგრამა უფრო მეტად გავაკეთება სინამდვილეების სინამდვილეების სინამდვილეების სინამდვილეების განაცემის მოდელი (GNN-TabFact), 72,2% დან 73,9% დან უფრო მეტად მოდელურ მნიშვნელოვანი ინფორმაცია, რომელიც უჯრედების რენგენციებით და წინ განსწავლა კითხვის დასაუმატებით დაახლოებით 76%-ზე. ჩვენ დამატებით განსხვავებულ რიცხვითი რაზუსტის სამუშაოდ და განსხვავებულ რაზუსტის სამუშაოდ განსხვავებული შეცდომების შეცდომების შეცდომების განსხვავება, რომელსაც ToTTo-ის სამუშაო ტექსტის სამუშაო და', 'it': "La crescente preoccupazione per la disinformazione online ha incoraggiato la ricerca sul PNL sulla verifica dei fatti. Poiché gli scrittori spesso basano le loro affermazioni su dati strutturati, ci concentriamo qui sulla verifica delle dichiarazioni testuali fornite nelle tabelle. Partendo dal modello Table Parsing (TAPAS) sviluppato per rispondere alle domande (Herzig et al., 2020), troviamo che la modellazione della struttura della tabella migliora un modello linguistico pre-addestrato sul testo non strutturato. I modelli linguistici pre-formazione sui dati della tabella inglese Wikipedia migliorano ulteriormente le prestazioni. Il pre-training su un compito di risposta alle domande con informazioni sul rank cellulare a livello di colonna raggiunge le migliori prestazioni. Grazie al miglioramento della pre-formazione e delle incorporazioni cellulari, questo approccio supera il modello di verifica dei fatti della tabella Neural Network (GNN-TabFact), aumentando l'accuratezza della classificazione delle dichiarazioni dal 72,2% al 73,9% anche senza modellare le informazioni numeriche. Incorporare informazioni numeriche con classifiche cellulari e pre-training in un compito di risposta alle domande aumenta la precisione al 76%. Analizziamo ulteriormente l'accuratezza delle dichiarazioni che implicano singole righe o più righe e colonne di tabelle, su diverse sottoattività di ragionamento numerico e sulla generalizzazione per rilevare errori nelle dichiarazioni derivate dal dataset di generazione tabella-testo ToTTO.", 'kk': 'Интернеттегі дұрыс түрлендіру үшін қорқынышты өзгерту NLP зерттеулерін тексеру үшін көмектеседі. Авторлар көбінесе құрылған деректеріне өзінің сәйкестіктерін негіздеп тұрғандықтан, кестелердегі мәтіндік мәліметтерді тексеру үшін көздеген. Кесте талдау (TAPAS) үлгісінен бастап, сұрақ жауап беру үшін (Herzig et al., 2020) құрылған модель үлгісінің құрылымы құрылмаған мәтінде алдын- ала оқылмаған тіл үлгісін жасайды. Ағылшынша Википедия кесте деректерінің алдын- оқыту тіл үлгілері жасайды. Бағандар деңгейіндегі ұяшықтар деңгейіндегі мәліметтің жауап беретін тапсырманың алдындағы оқыту үшін ең жақсы жұмыс істейді. Қосымша алдын- оқыту мен ұяшықтарды ендіру үшін, бұл тәсілі сандардың мәліметі үшін 72, 2% мен 73, 9% дегенге дейін өзгертеді. Бұл тәсілі сандардың мәліметін моделілмегенде де де, сандардың мәліметін өзгертеді. Ұяшықтар ретінде сандарды және алдындағы оқыту тапсырмасының алдындағы мәліметті ендіру 76% дегенге дейін. Біз бір жол немесе бірнеше жол не бірнеше бағандар мен кестелердің бағандарының дұрыстығын, бірнеше санды түсіндіру суреттерінде, және ToTTo кестесінен мәтін құру деректер жиынынан келтірілген мәліметтердің қателерін анықтау үшін жалпы анықта', 'lt': 'Didėjantis susirūpinimas dėl netinkamos informacijos internete paskatino NLP tyrimus faktų tikrinimo srityje. Kadangi rašytojai dažnai grindžia savo teiginius struktūriniais duomenimis, mes daugiausia dėmesio skiriame tekstinių teiginių, pateiktų lentelėse, patikrinimui. Atsižvelgdami į lentelės analizės (TAPAS) model į, parengtą atsakymui į klausimus (Herzig et al., 2020 m.), manome, kad modeliavimo stalo struktūra pagerina kalbos modelį, parengtą iš anksto dėl nesukurto teksto. Išankstinio mokymo kalbų modeliai anglų Vikipedijos lentelės duomenise dar labiau gerina rezultatus. Išankstinis mokymas atsakymo į klausimus užduotyje su stulpelio lygio elementų eilutės informacija užtikrina geriausius rezultatus. Geriau parengus mokymą ir įterpiant ląsteles, šis metodas yra geriausias nei naujausias skaitmeniniu požiūriu žinomas grafinio nervinio tinklo lentelės faktų tikrinimo modelis (GNN-TabFact), didinant pareiškimų klasifikacijos tikslumą nuo 72,2 % iki 73,9 %, net ir nepamodeliuojant skaitmeninės informacijos. Skaitmeninės informacijos įtraukimas į langelio klasifikacijas ir išankstinis mokymas atsakant į klausimus padidina tikslumą iki 76 %. Toliau analizuojame tikslumą pareiškimuose, susijusiuose su vienomis eilutėmis arba keliomis eilutėmis ir lentelių stulpeliais, skirtingais skaitmeniniais motyvavimo paklausimais ir apie klaidų nustatymą iš ToTTo lentelės į tekstą duomenų rinkinio.', 'mk': 'Растечката загриженост за онлајн погрешни информации го охрабри истражувањето на НЛП за верификација на фактите. Бидејќи писателите честопати ги базираат своите тврдења на структурирани податоци, ние се фокусираме тука на верификување на текстуалните изјави дадени докази во таблички. Почнувајќи од моделот за анализирање на масата (ТАПАС) развиен за одговори на прашања (Херциг и други, 2020), откривме дека структурата на масата за моделирање подобрува јазички модел предобучен на неструктурен текст. Претренирањето на јазичките модели на англиските податоци од табелата на Википедија понатаму ја подобрува перформансата. Преттренирањето на задачата за одговор на прашања со информации за ранг на клетки на ниво на колона ја постигнува најдобрата резултат. Со подобрена предобука и вградба на ќелии, овој пристап го надминува најсовремениот модел за верификација на фактите на масата на графската неурална мрежа (GNN-TabFact), зголемувајќи ја прецизноста на класификацијата на изјавата од 72,2 отсто на 73,9 отсто дури и без моделирање на бројни информации. Вклучувањето на бројни информации со рангирање на ќелиите и предобука за задача на одговор на прашања ја зголемува точноста на 76 отсто. We further analyze accuracy on statements implicating single rows or multiple rows and columns of tables, on different numerical reasoning subtasks, and on generalizing to detecting errors in statements derived from the ToTTo table-to-text generation dataset.', 'ms': 'Kebimbangan semakin besar dengan maklumat salah online telah mendorong kajian NLP mengenai pengesahan fakta. Since writers often base their assertions on structured data, we focus here on verifying textual statements given evidence in tables.  Mulai dari model Penghuraian Jadual (TAPAS) yang dikembangkan untuk menjawab soalan (Herzig et al., 2020), kami mendapati bahawa struktur meja pemodelan memperbaiki model bahasa yang dilatih-dilatih pada teks tidak terstruktur. Model bahasa pratelatihan pada data jadual Wikipedia Inggeris meningkatkan prestasi lebih lanjut. Latihan awal pada tugas menjawab soalan dengan maklumat rangkaian sel aras lajur mencapai prestasi terbaik. Dengan perkembangan praselatihan dan penyambungan sel, pendekatan ini melampaui model pengesahan fakta jadual Rangkaian Neural Graf yang sedar-secara numerik (GNN-TabFact), meningkatkan ketepatan pengesahan pernyataan dari 72.2% ke 73.9% walaupun tanpa memmodelkan maklumat numerik. Mengangkut maklumat nombor dengan peringkat sel dan praselatihan pada tugas jawapan soalan meningkatkan ketepatan ke 76%. Kami menganalisis lebih lanjut ketepatan pada pernyataan yang melibatkan baris tunggal atau baris berbilang dan lajur jadual, pada subsoalan alasan nombor berbeza, dan pada pengumuman untuk mengesan ralat dalam pernyataan yang berasal dari set data generasi jadual-ke-teks ToTTo.', 'ml': 'ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d തെറ്റായ വിവരങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് വിചാരം വരുത്തുന്നത് സത്യം ഉറപ്പാക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി N എഴുതുന്നവര്\u200d പലപ്പോഴും സ്ഥാപിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d അവരുടെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, ടെക്സ്കൂള്\u200d വാക ടേബിള്\u200d പാര്\u200dസിംഗ് (TAPAS) മോഡല്\u200d തുടങ്ങിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിനായി (ഹെര്\u200dസിഗ് et al., 2020), ടേബിളിന്റെ മോഡല്\u200d ഘടനയില്\u200d നിന്നും നിര ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് വിക്കിപിഡിയയുടെ ടേബിളിലെ മുന്നോട്ട് പരിശീലിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്ര ഒരു ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം ചെയ്യുന്ന ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ മുന്നില്\u200d പരിശീലനത്തിനുള്ള പരിശീലനം നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക മുന്നോട്ട് പരിശീലനവും സെല്\u200d അകത്തേക്കും മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തപ്പെടുന്നതിനുമുമ്പ് ഈ സമ്മാനം എണ്ണിക്കല്\u200d അറിയുന്ന ഗ്രാഫ് നെയുറല്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റാള്\u200d നെറ്റാള്\u200d ടേബിള്\u200d സാക്ഷ്യം പര ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്ന ജോലിയില്\u200d സെല്\u200d റാങ്ങിങ്ങുകളുമായി സംഖ്യയുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടു ടോട്ടിടോ ടേബിളില്\u200d നിന്നും ടെക്സ് തലമുറയില്\u200d നിന്നും വരികളില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d പിശകുകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d പിശകുകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത', 'mt': 'It-tħassib dejjem jikber dwar l-informazzjoni ħażina onlajn inkoraġġixxa r-riċerka tal-NLP dwar il-verifika tal-fatti. Billi l-kittieba spiss jibbażaw l-affermazzjonijiet tagħhom fuq dejta strutturata, hawnhekk niffokaw fuq il-verifika tad-dikjarazzjonijiet testwali mogħtija evidenza fit-tabelli. Mill-mudell tal-Analiżi tat-Tabella (TAPAS) żviluppat għat-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet (Herzig et al., 2020), isibu li l-istruttura tal-mudell tat-tabella ttejjeb mudell lingwistiku mħarreġ minn qabel fuq test mhux strutturat. Il-mudelli lingwistiċi ta’ taħriġ minn qabel dwar id-dejta tat-tabella tal-Wikipedia Ingliża jkomplu jtejbu l-prestazzjoni. Pre-training on a question answering task with column-level cell rank information achieves the best performance.  B’taħriġ ta’ qabel u inkorporazzjoni aħjar taċ-ċelloli, dan l-approċċ huwa ogħla mill-mudell ta’ verifika tal-fatti tat-tabella tan-Netwerk Newrali tal-Graff (GNN-TabFact), li jżid il-pre ċiżjoni tal-klassifikazzjoni tad-dikjarazzjoni minn 72.2% għal 73.9% anki mingħajr l-immudellar tal-informazzjoni numerika. L-inkorporazzjoni ta’ informazzjoni numerika bil-klassifikazzjonijiet taċ-ċelloli u t-taħriġ minn qabel dwar kompitu ta’ tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet iżid il-pre ċiżjoni għal 76 %. We further analyze accuracy on statements implicating single rows or multiple rows and columns of tables, on different numerical reasoning subtasks, and on generalizing to detecting errors in statements derived from the ToTTo table-to-text generation dataset.', 'pl': 'Rosnące obawy o dezinformację internetową zachęciły NLP do badań nad weryfikacją faktów. Ponieważ pisarze często opierają swoje twierdzenia na danych ustrukturyzowanych, skupiamy się tutaj na weryfikacji stwierdzeń tekstowych podanych w tabelach. Wychodząc z modelu Table Parsing (TAPAS) opracowanego do odpowiedzi na pytania (Herzig et al., 2020), stwierdzimy, że struktura tabeli modelowania usprawnia model językowy wstępnie przeszkolony na niestrukturalnym tekście. Przedtreningowe modele językowe na angielskich danych tabeli Wikipedii dodatkowo poprawiają wydajność. Najlepszą wydajność osiąga szkolenie wstępne dotyczące zadania odpowiedzi na pytania z informacjami o rankingu komórek na poziomie kolumny. Dzięki ulepszonemu przedtreningowi i osadzeniu komórek podejście to przewyższa najnowocześniejszy model weryfikacji faktów tabeli GNN-TabFact (Numerical-aware Graph Neuroral Network), zwiększając dokładność klasyfikacji stwierdzeń od 72,2% do 73,9% nawet bez modelowania informacji numerycznych. Włączenie informacji numerycznych do rankingów komórek i wstępne szkolenie dotyczące zadania odpowiedzi na pytania zwiększa dokładność do 76%. Ponadto analizujemy dokładność instrukcji dotyczących pojedynczych wierszy lub wielu wierszy i kolumn tabel, różnych podzadań rozumowania numerycznego oraz uogólniania do wykrywania błędów w instrukcjach pochodzących z zestawu danych generowania tabeli-do-tekstu ToTTo.', 'ro': 'Îngrijorarea tot mai mare cu privire la dezinformare online a încurajat cercetarea PNL privind verificarea faptelor. Deoarece scriitorii își bazează adesea afirmațiile pe date structurate, ne concentrăm aici pe verificarea declarațiilor textuale prezentate în tabele. Pornind de la modelul Table Parsing (TAPAS) dezvoltat pentru răspunsul la întrebări (Herzig et al., 2020), constatăm că structura tabelului de modelare îmbunătățește un model lingvistic pre-instruit pe text nestructurat. Modelele lingvistice pre-instruire pe datele de tabel Wikipedia îmbunătățesc și mai mult performanța. Pregătirea pentru o sarcină de răspuns la întrebări cu informații de rang de celule la nivel de coloană obține cea mai bună performanță. Cu îmbunătățirea pregătirii și a încorporărilor celulare, această abordare depășește modelul de verificare a faptelor tabelului Neural Network (GNN-TabFact), sporind acuratețea clasificării declarațiilor de la 72,2% la 73,9% chiar și fără modelarea informațiilor numerice. Incorporarea informațiilor numerice cu clasamentele celulelor și pregătirea prealabilă într-o sarcină de răspuns la întrebări crește acuratețea la 76%. Analizăm acuratețea declarațiilor care implică rânduri unice sau mai multe rânduri și coloane de tabele, a diferitelor subactivități de raționament numeric și a generalizării la detectarea erorilor în declarațiile derivate din setul de date de generare tabel-text ToTTO.', 'mn': 'Интернет буруу хэлбэрээс сэтгэл санаа өсөх нь NLP-ын судалгааг үнэндээ шалгалтын тухай санал зориулсан. Зохиогчид ихэвчлэн бүтээгдсэн өгөгдлийн санааг баталдаг учраас бид энд ширээн дээр нотлогдсон мөн өгөгдлийг шалгахад анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Хүснэгтийн шинжилгээ (TAPAS) загвараас эхлээд асуулт хариултын төлөө (Herzig et al., 2020), бид хүснэгт бүтэц нь хэл загварыг бүтээгдэхгүй текст дээр урьд сургалтын загварыг сайжруулдаг. Англи хэлний Wikipedia хүснэгт өгөгдлийн талаар сургалтын өмнөх хэл загварууд илүү үр дүнг сайжруулдаг. Баганы хэмжээний эсийн хэмжээний мэдээллээр хариултын асуултын өмнө суралцах нь хамгийн сайн үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг. Өмнөх сургалтын болон эсийн хөгжлийн тусламжтайгаар энэ арга нь тоо хэмжээний мэдээллээс бага зэрэг 72.2% руу 73.9% хүртэл тоо хэмжээний мэдээллээс ч бага зэрэг дэвшүүлдэг. Хоёр цуврал, асуулт хариулах үйлдлийн алдын сургалтын тухай тоон мэдээллийг бүрдүүлэх нь 76% хүртэл тодорхой байдаг. Бид нэг мөр, олон мөр, мөр, хүснэгтийн баган, олон тооны шалтгааныг, олон тооны шалтгааныг, ToTTo хүснэгтийн үеийн бүтээлээс гарсан өгөгдлийн санаануудын алдаа олохын тулд илүү нарийвчлалыг шинжилгээ хийсэн.', 'no': 'Å auke bekymringar med feil informasjon på nettet har oppretta NLP-forskning om faktiskverifikasjon. Sidan brennarar ofte baserer assertingar sine på strukturerte data, fokuserer vi her på å verifisera tekstuttrykk gjeven beviser i tabeller. Startar frå tabelltolkingsmodulen (TAPAS) utvikla for spørsmål-svar (Herzig et al., 2020), finn vi at modellering av tabellstrukturen forbetrar eit språk-modell før-trent på ikkje-strukturert tekst. Førehandsvisingsmodular på engelsk tabelldata for Wikipedia forbetrar utviklingar. Førehandsvising på eit spørsmål som svarar på oppgåve med kolonnenivå-celleringsinformasjon gjer det beste utviklinga. Med forbetra føreøving og innbygging av celler, utfører denne tilnærminga tilstanden til kunsten numerisk kjent ut kontrollmodellen for verifikasjon av grensetabellen nøyralt nettverk (GNN-TabFact), øker klassifikasjon for uttrykk frå 72,2% til 73,9% sjølv utan modellering av numeriske informasjon. Inkorporasjon av numeriske informasjon med cellrankingar og føreøving på eit oppgåve som svarar på spørsmål øker nøyaktighet til 76 %. Vi analyserer meir nøyaktighet på uttrykk som impliserer enkelte rader eller fleire rader og kolonner av tabeller, på ulike numeriske underspørsmål for å finna feil i uttrykk som er avhengig frå datasettet for oppretting av tabellen til tekst.', 'sv': 'Den växande oron för felaktig information på nätet har uppmuntrat NLP-forskning om faktakontroll. Eftersom författare ofta baserar sina påståenden på strukturerade data fokuserar vi här på att verifiera textpåståenden som ges bevis i tabeller. Med utgångspunkt från Table Parsing (TAPAS)-modellen som utvecklats för frågeställning (Herzig et al., 2020) finner vi att modellering av tabellstruktur förbättrar en språkmodell som är färdigtränad på ostrukturerad text. Språkmodeller inför utbildning på engelska Wikipedia tabelldata förbättrar prestandan ytterligare. Förbräning på en frågesvarsuppgift med cellrankningsinformation på kolumnnivå ger bästa resultat. Med förbättrad pre-training och cellinbäddningar överträffar detta tillvägagångssätt den senaste Numerically-award Graph Neural Network table fact verifikationsmodellen (GNN-TabFact), vilket ökar precisionen för statements klassificering från 72,2% till 73,9% även utan modellering av numerisk information. Att införliva numerisk information med cellrankning och pre-training i en frågesvarsuppgift ökar noggrannheten till 76%. Vi analyserar vidare noggrannhet på påståenden som implicerar enstaka rader eller flera rader och kolumner i tabeller, på olika numeriska resonemang underaktiviteter, och på generalisering för att upptäcka fel i påståenden som härrör från ToTTO tabell-till-text generering datauppsättningen.', 'sr': 'Povećanje zabrinutosti o malformaciji na internetu potaklo je istraživanje NLP-a o verificiji činjenica. Pošto pisaci često baziraju svoje tvrdnje na strukturiranim podacima, fokusiramo se ovde na proverenje tekstualnih izjava podataka dokazima u tablama. Počevši od model a analize tablica (TAPAS) razvijenog za odgovor na pitanja (Herzig et al., 2020), smatramo da je struktura modela tablica poboljšala jezički model predobučen na neostrukturnom tekstu. Modeli preobuke jezika na tablici engleskog Vikipedije dodatno poboljšavaju izvođenje. Pre obuke na pitanju odgovarajući zadatak sa informacijama o nivou ćelija na kolonima postiže najbolje izvršenje. Uz poboljšanje predobuke i uključenja ćelija, taj pristup iznosi državu umetnički brojno svestan model provjere činjenica grafa neuronske mreže (GNN-TabFact), povećanje tačnosti klasifikacije izjave od 72,2% do 73,9% čak i bez modela brojnih informacija. Uključujući brojne informacije sa redovima stanica i predobuku na zadatak odgovornog na pitanje povećava tačnost na 76%. Dalje analiziramo tačnost izjava koja uključuje jednostavne rede ili više reda i kolumne stolova, na različite podstave brojnih razuma, i generalizaciju grešaka u izjavama iz kompleta podataka za proizvodnju tabla do teksta ToTTo.', 'si': 'ඇන්ලයින් වැරදිය විදිහට විශාලනය කරනවා NLP පරීක්ෂණය ඇත්තටම පරීක්ෂණය ගැන. ලියාකාරයෝ සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ඔවුන්ගේ සංස්ථාපිත දත්තේ අධාරණය කරන්න, අපි මෙහෙ පැත්තේ සාක්ෂි දෙන්න පැත්ත ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරය (HerZig et al., 2020යි) ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරය (TAPAS) නිර්මාණයෙන් පටන් ගන්නවා, අපි හොයාගන්නවා මොඩේල් සංවිධානය ව ඉංග්\u200dරීසි විකිපිඩියා දත්තේ ප්\u200dරධාන භාෂාව මොඩේල්ස් වලින් ප්\u200dරධානය කරනවා. ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස්තාම්පති සෙල්ලම් සංකේත ප්\u200dරධානය සහ සෙල්ලම් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, මේ විධානය ප්\u200dරධානයක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්නේ අංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට අංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට ග්\u200dරාෆ් න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලම් ත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතිච්චාර කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මක තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ විශ්වාස කරනවා සහ ප්\u200dර අපි තවත් විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වලින් එක පාරක් නැත්තම් පාරක් නැත්තම් පාරක් වලින් වලින් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වලින්', 'so': "Waxyaabaha ku saabsan macluumaadka khaladda ah ee internetka waxaa lagu dhiirrigeliyey baaritaanka NLP ee ku saabsan xaqiijinta. Sida darteed qoraalayaashu marar badan waxyaabaha ay ku qoran yihiin macluumaadka la dhisay, waxaynu halkan ku fiirsanaynaa si aan u xaqiijinno warqadaha qoraalka ee looxyada lagu qoray caddeynta. Markii laga bilaabo sameynta jardiinada tababarka (TAPAS) oo loo horumariyey jawaabta su'aalaha (Herzig et al., 2020), waxaan helaynaa in dhismaha tababarka lagu sameynayo uu horay u beddelo model luuqada oo ku qoran text aan la dhisay. Tilmaamaha afka hore ee Ingiriis Wikipedia macluumaadka ku saabsan tababarka horumarinta ayaa horumarinaya tababarka. Waxbarashada u horeeya shaqo ka jawaaba su’aalaha, macluumaadka heerka safka ah wuxuu gaadhaa sameynta ugu wanaagsan. Marka lagu hagaajiyey koorasyada horumarinta iyo midowga cellada, kanu wuxuu ka soo baxdaa dowladda-art-art-aware-graph Neural Network model verification xaqiijinta (GNN-TabFact), wuxuuna kordhiyaa fasaxa hadalka oo ka mid ah 72.2% ilaa 73.9% xittaa aan sameyn macluumaad tiro ah. Incorporating numerical information with cell rankings and pre-training on a question-answering task increases accuracy to 76%.  Sidoo kale waxaynu ku sawirannaa saqafka ku saabsan saf keliya ama saf kala duduwan iyo saqafka miisaska, meelaha lagu sameeyo sababo kala duduwan, iyo marka lagu soo bandhigi karo qaladyo ka soo jeeda macluumaadka sameynta miiska ToTTo-ilaa-text.", 'ur': 'آنلاین کے غلط اندازے کے ساتھ اضافہ ہونے کے باعث NLP تحقیقات کو سفارش دی ہے. لکھنے والے اکثر اپنی آزمائش کو ساختہ ڈیٹا پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں، ہم یہاں تفصیل کی تصدیق کرنے پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں ٹیبل پارسینگ (TAPAS) موڈل سے شروع کیا گیا ہے سوال جواب کے لئے (Herzig et al., 2020) ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ موڈلینگ ٹیبل ساختاری ایک زبان موڈل غیر ساختہ متن پر پیش آموزش کی جاتی ہے۔ انگلیسی ویکیپیڈیا ٹیبل ڈاکٹ پر پیش ترسین کی زبان موڈل اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ ایک سؤال کے بارے میں پوچھنے کی جواب دینے والی سوال پر پیش آموزش کے ساتھ کلام-سئل رے نقطہ معلومات کے ساتھ بہترین کام پہنچتی ہے. اس طریقہ کے ساتھ پیش آموزش اور سلول ایمبڈینگ کے ساتھ، اس طریقہ سے زیادہ آرام کرتا ہے، جبکہ نمائندگی کے بغیر نمائندگی کے گراف نیورل نیورل نیورل نیورل نیورل ٹیبل ٹیبل ٹیبل ٹیبل موڈل (GNN-TabFact) کی حالت سے 72.2% سے 73.9% تک۔ سئل رئنڈنگ کے ساتھ شماری معلومات اور سوال جواب دینے کے کام پر پیش آموزش کے ساتھ جمع کرنا 76% تک اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ ہم نے ایک صف یا بہت سی صف اور ٹیبل کے ستونوں پر، مختلف تعداد منطق کے ساتھ، اور توٹو ٹیبل-ٹیبل-ٹیبل-ٹیبل-ٹیکسٹ ڈیٹ سٹ سے اپنا خطا شناسایا کرنے کے لئے غلطی کے بارے میں دقیق تحلیل کر دیا ہے.', 'ta': 'ஆன்லைன் தவறான தகவல் பற்றி கவலைப்படுத்தல் உண்மையை உறுதிப்படுத்துதல் பற்றி NLP ஆராய்ச்சியை ஆராய்ச்ச Since writers often base their assertions on structured data, we focus here on verifying textual statements given evidence in tables.  அட்டவணை பாசிங் மாதிரி உருவாக்கப்பட்டது (ஹெர்சிக் et al., 2020) கேள்விக்கு பதிலாக உருவாக்கப்பட்டது, மாதிரி உருவமைப்பு மாதிரி உரையை முன் பயிற்சியாக மா ஆங்கிலம் விகிபிடியா அட்டவணையில் முன் பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரிகளின் மாதிரிகளை மேலும் செய்யும். கேள்வி பதில் செய்யும் பணியின் முன் பயிற்சி மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட முன் பயிற்சி மற்றும் அறை பொருள் உள்ளடக்கங்களுடன், இந்த வழிமுறை எண்ணிக்கையில் தெரியும் வரை வரையறை நெயுரல் பிணைப்பு வலைப்பின்னல் உண்மையை சரிபார்க்கும் மாதிரி முற செல் வரிசைகளுடன் எண்ணிக்கையான தகவல்களை அதிகரிக்கிறது மற்றும் கேள்வி பதில் செய்யும் பணியில் முன்பயிற்சியை முன் நாம் மேலும் ஒரு வரிசைகள் அல்லது பல வரிசைகள் மற்றும் நெடுவரிசைகள் அட்டவணைகளில், வேறு எண்ணிக்கையான துணை பணிகளில், மற்றும் ToTTo அட்டவணையிலிருந்து உரை உரை உருவாக்கும் தகவல் அம', 'vi': "Mối quan tâm lớn về tin sai lầm trực tuyến đã thúc đẩy nghiên cứu về thực tế. Vì các nhà văn thường dựa trên các dữ liệu cấu trúc, chúng tôi tập trung vào việc kiểm tra các lời khai văn bản được đưa ra trên bảng. Bắt đầu từ mô hình Bàn Tiếp tân (TAEP) được tạo ra để trả lời câu hỏi (Herzig et al., 2020), chúng tôi thấy rằng cấu trúc mô hình bàn mẫu mô hình ngôn ngữ cải thiện mô hình không xây dựng trên một văn bản không xây dựng. Các mô hình ngôn ngữ trước khi đào tạo trên bảng Wikipedia cải thiện thêm nữa. Huấn luyện trước trong một nhiệm vụ trả lời câu hỏi với thông tin cấp số cột đạt được hiệu suất tốt nhất. Với việc nâng cao khả năng kiểm soát sự cấy ghép tế bào, cách tiếp cận này đạt được khả năng cao nhất của Hệ thống, dựa trên cấu hình thần kinh (GNN-TabFact), tăng cường độ chính xác phân loại phát biểu từ 72=.='và 73.9=. Thậm chí không cần phải có thông tin số người mẫu. Kết hợp các thông tin số với cấp số phòng giam và khóa huấn luyện trong nhiệm vụ trả lời câu hỏi tăng độ chính xác lên 37. Chúng tôi phân tích độ chính xác những phát biểu có liên quan tới hàng đơn hay hàng loạt các cột và các bảng, về các mặt phụ đề lập số khác nhau, và về việc tổng hợp để phát hiện lỗi trong các phát hiện từ bộ dữ liệu từ thế hệ hai chữ.", 'uz': 'Name Since writers often base their assertions on structured data, we focus here on verifying textual statements given evidence in tables.  Name Name Name @ info: status Name Biz bir necha satr yoki bir nechta satr va jadvalning ustunlari bilan bir nechta satr va bir nechta ustunlarni aniqlamiz va har xil sabablar tub vazifalarda xatolarni aniqlash va ToTTo jadvaldan matn yaratilgan maʼlumot tarkibini aniqlashda xato roʻyxatni aniqlash.', 'nl': 'De groeiende bezorgdheid over online misinformatie heeft NLP-onderzoek naar feitenverificatie gestimuleerd. Aangezien schrijvers hun beweringen vaak baseren op gestructureerde gegevens, richten we ons hier op het verifiëren van tekstuele verklaringen die in tabellen worden aangetoond. Uitgaande van het Table Parsing (TAPAS) model dat is ontwikkeld voor het beantwoorden van vragen (Herzig et al., 2020), vinden we dat modellering tabelstructuur een taalmodel verbetert dat vooraf is getraind op ongestructureerde tekst. Pre-training taalmodellen op Engelse Wikipedia tabelgegevens verbeteren de prestaties verder. Voortraining op een vragenantwoordtaak met celranginformatie op kolomniveau levert de beste prestaties. Met verbeterde pre-training en cel embeddings presteert deze benadering beter dan het state-of-the-art Numerical-aware Graph Neural Network table fact verification model (GNN-TabFact), waardoor de nauwkeurigheid van statement classification wordt verhoogd van 72,2% tot 73,9% zelfs zonder numerieke informatie te modelleren. Het opnemen van numerieke informatie met celrankings en pretraining op een vragenantwoordtaak verhoogt de nauwkeurigheid tot 76%. We analyseren verder de nauwkeurigheid van statements die enkele rijen of meerdere rijen en kolommen van tabellen impliceren, op verschillende numerieke redeneringssubtaken en op het generaliseren van fouten in statements afgeleid van de ToTTo tabel-naar-tekst generatie dataset.', 'da': 'Den voksende bekymring for onlinemisinformation har tilskyndet til forskning i NLP om faktisk verifikation. Da forfattere ofte baserer deres påstande på strukturerede data, fokuserer vi her på at verificere tekstudsagn givet bevis i tabeller. Med udgangspunkt i modellen Table Parsing (TAPAS), der er udviklet til spørgsmålsbesvarelse (Herzig et al., 2020), finder vi ud af, at modellering tabelstruktur forbedrer en sprogmodel, der er prætrænet på ustruktureret tekst. Sprogmodeller på engelsk Wikipedia-tabeldata forbedrer yderligere ydeevnen. Foruddannelse i en spørgsmålsbesvarelsesopgave med oplysninger om celleplacering på kolonneniveau opnår den bedste ydeevne. Med forbedret præ-træning og celleindlejringer overgår denne tilgang den avancerede Numerical-award Graph Neural Network tabel fact verifikation model (GNN-TabFact), hvilket øger angivelsesklassificeringsnøjagtigheden fra 72,2% til 73,9% selv uden modellering af numeriske oplysninger. Ved at indarbejde numerisk information med celleplaceringer og forudgående træning i en spørgsmålsbesvarelsesopgave øges nøjagtigheden til 76%. Vi analyserer yderligere nøjagtigheden af sætninger, der involverer enkelte rækker eller flere rækker og kolonner af tabeller, på forskellige numeriske ræsonnement underopgaver og på generalisering til detektering af fejl i sætninger afledt af ToTTo tabel-til-tekst generation datasæt.', 'hr': 'Povećanje zabrinutosti s online pogrešnom informacijom potaklo je istraživanje NLP-a o provjeri činjenica. Pošto pisaci često baziraju svoje tvrdnje na strukturiranim podacima, fokusiramo se ovdje na provjeru tekstualnih izjava podataka dokazima u tablama. Počevši od model a analize tablica (TAPAS) razvijenog za odgovor na pitanje (Herzig et al., 2020), smatramo da struktura tablica modela poboljšava jezički model predobučen na neostrukturnom tekstu. Modeli preobuke jezika na tablici engleskog Wikipedia dalje poboljšavaju učinkovitost. Prije obuke na pitanju odgovarajući zadatak s informacijama o razini stanica na stupnjevima postiže najbolji učinak. Uz poboljšanje predobuke i uključenja stanica, taj pristup iznosi stanje brojno svjesnog modela provjere činjenica grafa neuronske mreže (GNN-TabFact), povećanje to čnosti klasifikacije izjave od 72,2% do 73,9% čak i bez modela brojnih informacija. Uključujući brojne informacije s redovima stanica i predobuku na zadatak odgovornog na pitanje povećava preciznost na 76%. Dalje analiziramo preciznost izjava koja uključuju jednostavne rede ili višestruke rede i kolumne tablica, na različitim podstavljanjima brojnih razloga i na generalizaciju grešaka u izjavama iz kompleta podataka za proizvodnju tablica do teksta ToTTo.', 'de': 'Die wachsende Sorge um Online-Fehlinformationen hat die NLP-Forschung zur Faktenverifizierung ermutigt. Da Autoren ihre Behauptungen oft auf strukturierten Daten stützen, konzentrieren wir uns hier auf die Verifizierung textueller Aussagen, die in Tabellen nachgewiesen werden. Ausgehend vom Table Parsing (TAPAS)-Modell, das für die Beantwortung von Fragen entwickelt wurde (Herzig et al., 2020), stellen wir fest, dass Modellierungstabellenstruktur ein Sprachmodell verbessert, das auf unstrukturiertem Text vortrainiert wurde. Das Training von Sprachmodellen auf englischsprachigen Wikipedia-Tabellendaten verbessert die Leistung weiter. Das Vorbereiten einer Fragebeantwortung mit Zellenrankinformationen auf Spaltenebene erzielt die beste Leistung. Mit verbesserten Pre-Training und Zelleinbettungen übertrifft dieser Ansatz das hochmoderne numerisch bewusste Graph Neural Network Table Fact (GNN-TabFact) und erhöht die Genauigkeit der Anweisungsklassifizierung von 72,2% auf 73,9% auch ohne Modellierung numerischer Informationen. Die Einbeziehung numerischer Informationen in Zellrankings und Vortraining für eine Fragebeantwortung erhöht die Genauigkeit auf 76%. Weiterhin analysieren wir die Genauigkeit von Anweisungen, die einzelne Zeilen oder mehrere Zeilen und Spalten von Tabellen implizieren, von verschiedenen Unteraufgaben numerischer Argumentation und von der Verallgemeinerung bis zur Erkennung von Fehlern in Anweisungen, die aus dem ToTTo-Tabellen-zu-Text-Generierungsdatensatz abgeleitet wurden.', 'bg': 'Нарастващата загриженост за онлайн дезинформация насърчи изследванията на НЛП за проверка на фактите. Тъй като авторите често основават твърденията си на структурирани данни, ние се фокусираме тук върху проверката на текстови твърдения, представени в таблици. Като се започне от модела за анализ на таблицата (разработен за отговор на въпроси (Херзиг и др., 2020), откриваме, че моделирането на структурата на таблицата подобрява езиков модел, предварително обучен върху неструктуриран текст. Предварително обучение езикови модели в таблицата на английски Уикипедия допълнително подобряват ефективността. Предварителното обучение по задача за отговор на въпроси с информация за ранга на клетките на ниво колона постига най-доброто представяне. С подобрените предварителни обучения и вграждането на клетки, този подход превъзхожда най-съвременния модел за проверка на фактите на таблицата с цифрово знание (увеличава точността на класификацията на твърденията от 72,2% на 73,9% дори без моделиране на цифрова информация. Включването на цифрова информация с клетъчна класация и предварителното обучение по задача за отговор на въпроси увеличава точността до 76%. Освен това анализираме точността на изявления, включващи единични редове или няколко реда и колони от таблици, на различни подзадачи за числено разсъждаване и на обобщаване за откриване на грешки в изявления, получени от набор от данни за генериране на таблица към текст.', 'id': 'Kecemasan semakin besar dengan misinformasi online telah mendorong penelitian NLP tentang verifikasi fakta. Karena penulis sering mendasarkan pernyataan mereka pada data struktur, kita fokus di sini pada verifikasi pernyataan tekstual yang diberikan bukti dalam tabel. Mulai dari model Analisasi Tabel (TAPAS) yang dikembangkan untuk menjawab pertanyaan (Herzig et al., 2020), kami menemukan bahwa struktur meja model meningkatkan model bahasa yang dilatih-dilatih pada teks tidak terstruktur. Model bahasa prapelatihan pada data meja Wikipedia Inggris lebih memperbaiki prestasi. Pra-pelatihan pada tugas menjawab pertanyaan dengan informasi kelas sel kelas kolom mencapai prestasi terbaik. Dengan peningkatan prapelatihan dan penyambungan sel, pendekatan ini melebihi model verifikasi fakta Jaringan Neural Graph yang terbaik secara numerik (GNN-TabFact), meningkat akurasi klasifikasi pernyataan dari 72,2% ke 73,9% bahkan tanpa memmodelir informasi numerik. Memasukkan informasi numerik dengan peringkat sel dan praselatihan pada tugas menjawab pertanyaan meningkatkan akurasi ke 76%. Kami lebih lanjut menganalisis akurasi pada pernyataan yang melibatkan baris tunggal atau berbagai baris dan kolom tabel, pada subtasks pembalasan numerik yang berbeda, dan pada generalisasi untuk mendeteksi kesalahan dalam pernyataan yang berasal dari set data generasi tabel-ke-teks ToTTo.', 'ko': '온라인 오류 정보에 대한 관심이 날로 커지면서 NLP가 사실 검증에 대한 연구를 격려하고 있다.저자의 단언은 일반적으로 구조화된 데이터를 바탕으로 하기 때문에 우리는 여기서 증거를 제시하는 텍스트 문장을 중점적으로 검증한다.질의응답을 위한 표 해석(TAPAS) 모델(Herzig et al., 2020)부터 표 구조 모델링은 미리 훈련된 비구조화된 텍스트 언어 모델을 개선한 것으로 나타났다.영문 위키백과 표 데이터에 언어 모델을 미리 훈련시켜 성능을 한층 높였다.등급 단원 랭킹 정보를 사용하여 퀴즈 퀘스트에 대해 예비 훈련을 하면 최상의 성능을 얻을 수 있다.개선된 사전 훈련과 단원 삽입을 통해 최첨단 디지털 감지도 신경 네트워크 표 사실검증 모델(GNN TabFact)보다 우수한 방법으로 디지털 정보를 모델링하지 않더라도 문장 분류 정밀도를 72.2%에서 73.9%로 높였다.디지털 정보를 세포 순위와 퀴즈 미션의 예훈련과 결합하면 정확도를 76% 로 높일 수 있다.우리는 한 줄 또는 여러 줄과 여러 목록을 포함하는 문장, 서로 다른 수치 추리 서브퀘스트, Totto표에서 텍스트 생성 데이터까지 집중적으로 도출된 문장에서 오류의 정확성을 검출하는 것을 분석했다.', 'tr': 'Çaltylyk ýalňyş şeklinde aladalanmak üçin NLP barlagyny hakyky barlamak üçin täsirleşdirdi. Köplenç ýazymlar öz gürrüňlerini strukturlyk maglumatlara üýtgedýändigi sebäpli biz bu ýerde stollarda berilen tekst aýdylaryny barlamak üçin üns berýäris. TAPAS nusgasyndan başlaýan soragy jogap üçin gelişmiş (Herzig et al., 2020), täblisaň strukturynyň modelleşdirmegi düzümlenmedik metin üstünde öň-okuwçylmadyk dil nusgasyny gowuraýar. Iňlisçe wikipediýa täblisa maglumatlary barada öňki öňki bilim nusgalary gowylaşdyrýar. Häsiýet derejesi bilen jogap bermegi üçin bir soragyň öňünden öňki bilim gowy gazanýar. Gelişmiş öň-bilim we öýjük süzmeleri bilen, bu ýagdaý sanat taýýarlanmagynyň durumyny saýlaw bilen birleşýär Häsiýet derejesi bilen sanal maglumat taýýarlamak we soragy jogaplamak üçin öňünden öňünden başlamak üçin 76% dogrylygyny artýar. Biz ýene bir setir ýa-da köp setir we sütün sütünleri, farklı sanal mantıklaryň astynda, we ToTTo täblisaň-da metin döredilen hasaplaryň içinde hatalaryny tanyşdyrmak üçin deňlenýäris', 'fa': 'افزایش نگرانی با غلط توضیح آنلاین تحقیقات NLP در مورد تصدیق حقیقت تشویق کرد. از آنجایی که نویسندگان اغلب اعتراض خود را بر داده های ساخته بنیاد می دهند، ما در اینجا تمرکز می کنیم بر ثابت کردن اعتراض متن که مدرک در میز داده شده است. از مدل تحلیل میز (TAPAS) برای جواب سوال (Herzig et al., 2020) توسعه داده شده، می\u200cبینیم که ساختار میز مدل\u200cسازی یک مدل پیش\u200cآموزش زبانی را بر متن غیرساخته بهتر می\u200cکند. مدل های پیش آموزش زبانی در اطلاعات میز ویکیپدیا انگلیسی بیشتر عملکرد را بهتر می کند. پیش از آموزش روی یک سوال جواب دادن کار با اطلاعات درجه سلول\u200cهای سطح ستون به بهترین انجام رسیده است. با تحصیلات پیش آموزش و ابزار سلول\u200cهای بهتر شده، این دستور از موقعیت توصیلات شبکه\u200cهای عصبی گراف شماری\u200cآگاهی (GNN-TabFact) بیشتر از 72.2% تا 73.9% حتی بدون مدل\u200cسازی اطلاعات شماری بیشتر می\u200cشود. شامل اطلاعات تعدادی با رشته\u200cهای سلولها و آموزش پیش\u200cآموزش در یک کار جواب سوال دقیق به 76 درصد افزایش می\u200cدهد. ما دقیقات بیشتری را بر گزارش\u200cها تحلیل می\u200cکنیم که شامل یک صفحه یا چندین صفحه و ستون\u200cهای میز است، بر پایگاه\u200cهای منطق تعدادی متفاوت، و بر پایگاه\u200cهای عمومی که اشتباه\u200cها در گزارش\u200cهایی که از مجموعه داده\u200cهای میز-تا-متن تولید شده\u200cاند، از جمله تولی', 'sw': 'Kuongezeka na wasiwasi na taarifa zisizo sahihi za mtandaoni imewahamasisha utafiti wa NLP kuhusu ukweli wa kuthibitishwa. Kwa kuwa waandishi mara nyingi huweka matamko yao kwenye taarifa zilizojengwa, tunajikita hapa kuhakikisha kauli za msingi zilizotoa ushahidi kwenye meza. Kuanzia kutoka Mradi wa Uchaguzi wa Tabaa (TAPAS) uliundwa kwa ajili ya jibu la maswali (Herzig et al., 2020), tunagundua kuwa muundo wa muundo wa meza unaorodhesha muundo wa lugha unaoendelea kwa mafunzo ya awali kwenye maandishi yasiyotengenezwa. Mfano wa lugha za pre-mafunzo katika takwimu za mtandao wa Wikipedia unaoendelea kuboresha utendaji. Mafunzo ya awali kuhusu jukumu la kujibu na taarifa za vyeo vya simu zinafanikiwa ufanisi bora zaidi. Kwa kuongezeka kwa maendeleo ya mafunzo ya kabla na kuingia kwa simu za mkononi, mbinu hii inaonyesha hali ya ukweli wa ukweli wa Mtandao wa Neural wa idadi ya sanaa (GNN-TabFact), kuongeza uhakika wa kutangaza taarifa kutoka asilimia 72.2 hadi asilimia 73.9 hata bila kuongeza taarifa tarakimu. Kuongeza taarifa tarakimu na mabango ya simu za mkononi na mafunzo ya awali kuhusu kazi ya kujibu swali inaongezea uhakika kwa asilimia 76. Tunafanya uchambuzi wa uhakika zaidi juu ya matamko yanayohusiana na safu moja au safu mbalimbali za meza, katika jukumu tofauti za maana, na kwa ujumla wa kutambua makosa katika matamko yaliyotokana na seti ya vizazi vya teknolojia vya ToTTo.', 'sq': 'Shqetësimi në rritje me informatat e gabuara në internet ka inkurajuar kërkimin e NLP mbi verifikimin e fakteve. Since writers often base their assertions on structured data, we focus here on verifying textual statements given evidence in tables.  Starting from the Table Parsing (TAPAS) model developed for question answering (Herzig et al., 2020), we find that modeling table structure improves a language model pre-trained on unstructured text.  Modelet e paratrajnimit të gjuhës në tabelën angleze të Wikipedias përmirësojnë më tej performancën. Parastërvitja në një detyrë që përgjigjet pyetjeve me informacionin e nivelit të qelizave të kolonës arrin performancën më të mirë. Me përmirësimin e parastërvitjes dhe përfshirjes së qelizave, ky qasje ekziston më së miri se modeli i verifikimit të fakteve të tabelës Graph Neural Network (GNN-TabFact), duke rritur saktësinë e klasifikimit të deklaratave nga 72.2% në 73.9% edhe pa modeluar informacionin numerik. Duke përfshirë informacion numëror me renditjen e qelizave dhe parastërvitjen në një detyrë që përgjigjet pyetjeve rrit saktësinë në 76%. Ne analizojmë më tej saktësinë në deklaratat që përfshijnë rreshta të vetme apo rreshta të shumta dhe kolona të tabelave, në subtash të ndryshme të arsyetimit numëror dhe në gjeneralizimin për zbulimin e gabimeve në deklaratat e nxjerra nga kompleti i të dhënave të gjenerimit të tabelës në tekst ToTTo.', 'af': "Die groei bekommerding met online verkeerde formasie het NLP-ondersoek op feit-verifikasie aanbevestig. Omdat skrywers dikwels hul aanbevestings op struktureerde data baseer, fokus ons hier op die verifisering van tekstuurlike opklarings gegee getuienis in tabelle. Beginne van die tabel verwerking model (TAPAS) ontwikkeld vir vraag antwoord (Herzig et al., 2020), ons vind dat modellering tabel struktuur 'n taal model verbeter 'n taal model voor-opgelei op ongestruktureerde teks. Vorderoerwinning taal modele op Engels Wikipedia tabeldata verder verbeter prestasie. Vorderoefening op 'n vraag antwoord taak met kolom- vlak sel rank inligting bereik die beste prestasie. Met verbeterde voor-onderwerp en sel inbettings, hierdie toegang uitvoer die state-of-the-art Numeries-aware Graph Neurale Netwerk-tabel-feit verifikasie model (GNN-TabFact), die vergroot opdrag klassifikasie presies van 72.2% tot 73.9% selfs sonder om numeriese inligting te modelleer. Die inkorporeer van numeriese inligting met sel rankings en vooraf-onderwerp op 'n vraag-antwoordende taak verhoog presies tot 76%. Ons analyseer verdere waarskynlik op opdragte wat inkluister enkele rye of veelvuldige rye en kolomme van tabelle, op verskillende numeriese redekening subtaske, en op generalisering van foute in opdragte wat van die ToTTo tabel-na-teks genereering datastel afgeleide is.", 'az': 'ńįnternet yanlńĪŇü informasiyasńĪ il…ô endirilm…ôk NLP araŇütńĪrmalarńĪnńĪ h…ôqiq…ôt t…ôsdiql…ôm…ôsi haqqńĪnda t…ôŇükil etdi. YazńĪcńĪlar sńĪk-sńĪq √∂z iddialarńĪnńĪ strukturlńĪ veril…ôr √ľz…ôrind…ô t…ôsdiql…ôndirdikl…ôrin…ô g√∂r…ô, biz burada m…ôtn ifad…ôl…ôrini tabelalarda t…ôsdiql…ôm…ôy…ô baŇüladńĪq. S√∂yl…ô cavab verm…ôk (Herzig et al., 2020) modell…ôrind…ôn baŇülayńĪb, modell…ôrin s…ôhif…ôl…ôri qurulmadńĪńüńĪ m…ôtn √ľst√ľnd…ô …ôvv…ôl t…ôhsil edilmiŇü dil modell…ôrini yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrńĪr. ńįngilis Wikipedia tabelasńĪ m…ôlumatlarńĪnda …ôvv…ôl t…ôhsil dill…ôrinin modell…ôri daha yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrńĪr. S√ľtunlar s…ôviyy…ôsi h√ľcre s…ôviyy…ôsi m…ôlumatlarńĪ il…ô cavab ver…ôn sual √ľ√ß√ľn …ôvv…ôlc…ô t…ôhsil etm…ôk …ôn yaxŇüńĪ performans olar. √Ėn t…ôhsil v…ô h√ľcre inŇüallarńĪ il…ô, bu t…ôhsil, sayńĪsal m…ôlumatlarńĪ modellenm…ôd…ôn 72,2% il…ô 73,9%-d…ôn art ńĪr. H√ľcre s…ôviyy…ôl…ôri v…ô sual cavab ver…ôn iŇüin √∂n√ľnd…ô t…ôhsil edilm…ôsi √ľ√ß√ľn sayńĪsal m…ôlumat qatńĪlmasńĪ 76%-…ô y√ľks…ôr. Biz t…ôk s…ôf, √ßoxlu s…ôf v…ô s√ľtun, m√ľxt…ôlif sayńĪ fikirl…ôŇüdirm…ôk aparńĪcńĪlarńĪ v…ô ToTTo table-to-text n…ôsil veri qutusundan √ßńĪxarńĪlmńĪŇü ifad…ôl…ôrd…ô x…ôtalarńĪ keŇüfetm…ôk bar…ôsind…ô daha dońüruluńüu analiz edirik.', 'hy': 'Growing concern with online misinformation has encouraged NLP research on fact verification.  Քանի որ գրողները հաճախ հիմնում են իրենց հայտարարությունները կառուցվածքավորված տվյալների վրա, մենք կենտրոնանում ենք աղյուսակներում ապացույցների տակ գտնվող տեքստային հայտարարությունների ստուգելուն: Starting from the Table Parsing (TAPAS) model developed for question answering (Herzig et al., 2020), we find that modeling table structure improves a language model pre-trained on unstructured text.  Անգլերենի Վիքիփեդիայի աղյուսակի տվյալների լեզվի նախապատրաստման մոդելները ավելի բարելավում են արդյունքները: Առաջին պատրաստվածությունը հարցերին պատասխանելու խնդիրներին սյունի մակարդակի բջջային ինֆորմացիայի միջոցով լավագույն արդյունք է ստանում: Այս մոտեցումը բարելավված նախապատրաստման և բջիջների ներգրավման միջոցով գերազանցում է թվային առումով գիտակցած գրաֆիկ նեյրոնալ ցանցի աղյուսակի փաստերի ստուգումների մոդելը (GNN-TabFat), աճելով հայտարարության դասակարգումների ճշգրտությունը 72.2-ից 73.9-ի, նույնիսկ առանց թվային Թվային ինֆորմացիայի ներառումը բջջային դասակարգում և հարցերի պատասխանատվող խնդիրների նախապատրաստումը բարձրացնում է ճշգրտությունը մինչև 76 տոկոս: Մենք նաև վերլուծում ենք ճշգրտությունը մեկ շարք կամ տախտակների բազմաթիվ շարքեր և սյուններ ներառող հայտարարությունների վրա, տարբեր թվային մտածողության ենթախնդիրների վրա, և ընդհանուր ընդհանուր սխալների հայտնաբերման վրա, որոնք առաջացել են ToSSo տախտակից տեքստի սերունդների', 'bs': 'Povećanje zabrinutosti o malformaciji na internetu potaklo je istraživanje NLP-a o verificiji činjenica. Pošto pisaci često baziraju svoje tvrdnje na strukturiranim podacima, fokusiramo se ovdje na proverenje tekstualnih izjava podataka dokazima u tablama. Počevši od model a analize tablice (TAPAS) razvijene za odgovor na pitanja (Herzig et al., 2020), smatramo da je struktura modela tablice poboljšala jezički model predobučen na neostrukturnom tekstu. Modeli preobuke jezika na tablici engleskog Wikipedije dodatno poboljšavaju učinkovitost. Prije obuke na pitanju odgovarajući zadatak sa informacijama o nivou stanica na kolonima postiže najbolji izvor. Uz poboljšanje predobuke i integracije ćelija, taj pristup iznosi stanje umetnički brojno svestan model verificije činjenica grafa neuronske mreže (GNN-TabFact), povećanje to čnosti klasifikacije izjava od 72,2% do 73,9% čak i bez modela brojnih informacija. Uključujući brojne informacije sa redovima stanica i predobuku na zadatku odgovornog na pitanje povećava preciznost na 76%. Dalje analiziramo preciznost izjava koje uključuju jednostavne rede ili više reda i kolona stolova, na različitim podstavljanjima brojnih razloga, i generalizaciju grešaka u izjavama iz kompleta podataka za proizvodnju tabla do teksta ToTTo.', 'bn': 'অনলাইন ভুল তথ্যের ব্যাপারে উদ্বেগ প্রদান করা হচ্ছে এনএলপি গবেষণা সত্যি নিশ্চিত করার জন্য উৎসাহিত যেহেতু লেখকদের প্রায়শই তাদের সংস্কৃত তথ্যের উপর তাদের অভিযোগ নির্ভর করে, আমরা টেবিলে প্রমাণ প্রদান করা টেক্সটেলে  টেবিল পার্জিং (টাপাএস) মডেল থেকে প্রশ্নের উত্তরের জন্য উন্নয়ন করা হয়েছে (হার্জিগ এন্ট আল, ২০২০০), আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে মডেলিং টেবিলের কাঠামো তৈরি করা হচ্ছ ইংরেজি উইকিপিডিয়া টেবিলে প্রশিক্ষণের পূর্বে ভাষার মডেল আরো উন্নতি করে। কলাম-স্তরের স্তরের তথ্যের সাথে প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রশিক্ষণের পূর্বে প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষণের প্রশিক্ষণের প্রশিক পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষণ এবং সেল বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন সংখ্যাত সংখ্যাত সংখ্যা পরিচিত গ্রাফ নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক টেবিলের তথ্য পরীক্ষা মোডেল (GNN-TabFact), ৭২. ২% থেকে ৭৩. সেল রাঙ্কিং এবং প্রশ্নের প্রশিক্ষণের পূর্ববর্তী প্রশিক্ষণের সংখ্যা তথ্য বৃদ্ধি করে ৭৬%। We further analyze accuracy on statements implicating single rows or multiple rows and columns of tables, on different numerical reasoning subtasks, and on generalizing to detecting errors in statements derived from the ToTTo table-to-text generation dataset.', 'ca': "La creixent preocupació per la mala informació en línia ha incentivat la recerca del NLP sobre la verificació de fets. Com que els escriptors sovint basen les seves afirmacions en dades estructuradas, ens concentrem aquí en verificar les afirmacions textuals donades a les taules. A partir del model d'analització de taules (TAPAS) desenvolupat per respondre a preguntes (Herzig et al., 2020), trobem que l'estructura de taules de modelació millora un model de llenguatge pré-entrenat en text no estructurat. Els models de llenguatge de pré-entrenament a la taula de Wikipedia anglesa milloren encara més el rendiment. El pré-entrenament d'una tasca de resposta a preguntes amb informació sobre la classe de cèl·lules a nivell de columna aconsegueix el millor rendiment. Amb una millor capacitació preventiva i incorporació de cèl·lules, aquest enfocament supera el model de verificació de fets de la taula Graph Neural Network (GNN-TabFact) d'última tecnologia, augmentant la precisió de la classificació de la declaració del 72,2% al 73,9%, fins i tot sense modelar la informació numèrica. Incorporar informació numèrica amb classements cèl·lulars i pré-entrenament en una tasca de resposta a preguntes augmenta la precisió al 76%. També analitzem la precisió de les declaracions que impliquen files únices o múltiples files i columnes de taules, de diferents subtaskes numbèriques de raonament i de generalització a la detecció d'errors en declaracions derivades del conjunt de dades de generació de taules a textos ToTTo.", 'cs': 'Rostoucí obavy o dezinformace on-line podpořily výzkum NLP týkající se ověřování faktů. Jelikož spisovatelé často zakládají svá tvrzení na strukturovaných datech, zaměřujeme se zde na ověřování textových prohlášení uvedených v tabulkách. Na základě modelu Table Parsing (TAPAS) vyvinutého pro odpověď na otázky (Herzig et al., 2020) zjišťujeme, že struktura modelování tabulky zlepšuje jazykový model předem trénovaný na nestrukturovaném textu. Předškolení jazykových modelů na tabulkových datech anglické Wikipedie dále zlepšuje výkon. Předškolení na úkol zodpovězení otázek s informacemi o hodnocení buněk na úrovni sloupců dosahuje nejlepšího výkonu. Díky vylepšenému předškolení a vkládání buněk tento přístup překonává nejmodernější model ověřování faktů tabulky GNN-TabFact (Numericky aware Graph Neural Network), což zvyšuje přesnost klasifikace příkazů od 72,2% na 73,9% i bez modelování numerických informací. Začlenění číselných informací do žebříčku buněk a předškolení na úkol zodpovězení otázek zvyšuje přesnost na 76%. Dále analyzujeme přesnost příkazů zahrnujících jednotlivé řádky nebo více řádků a sloupců tabulek, na různých dílčích úkolech numerického uvažování a na zobecnění chyb v příkazů odvozených z datové sady ToTTo pro generování tabulek na text.', 'et': 'Kasvav mure internetipõhise valeteabe pärast on julgustanud uue õigusloome uuringuid faktide kontrollimiseks. Kuna kirjanikud tuginevad sageli oma väidetele struktureeritud andmetele, keskendume siin tabelites tõendatud tekstiliste väidete kontrollimisele. Alustades küsimustele vastamiseks välja töötatud tabeli parsimise (TAPAS) mudelist (Herzig et al., 2020) leiame, et tabeli struktuuri modelleerimine parandab struktureerimata teksti eelnevalt koolitatud keelemudelit. Eelkoolituse keelemudelid inglise Vikipeedia tabeli andmetes parandavad veelgi jõudlust. Küsimustele vastamise ülesande eelkoolitus koos veergutaseme lahtrijärjestuse teabega saavutab parima tulemuse. Täiustatud eelkoolituse ja rakkude manustamisega ületab see lähenemisviis tipptasemel numbriliselt teadliku graafilise neurovõrgu tabeli faktide kontrollimise mudelit (GNN-TabFact), suurendades avalduste klassifitseerimise täpsust 72,2%-lt 73,9%-le isegi arvulise teabe modelleerimiseta. Arvulise teabe lisamine rakkude järjestuste ja küsimustele vastamise ülesande eelkoolitusega suurendab täpsust 76%ni. Lisaks analüüsime täpsust üksikuid või mitmeid tabelite rida ja veerge sisaldavate avalduste puhul, erinevate arvuliste arutluste alamülesannete puhul ning üldistamist, et tuvastada vigu avaldustes, mis tulenevad ToTTo tabelist tekstini genereerimise andmekogumist.', 'fi': 'Yhä kasvava huoli verkossa tapahtuvasta väärästä tiedosta on kannustanut NLP:n tutkimusta faktojen todentamisesta. Koska kirjoittajat usein perustavat väitteensä strukturoituun dataan, keskitymme tässä tarkistamaan taulukoissa esitettyjä tekstiväitteitä. Kysymysten vastaamiseen kehitetystä Table Parsing (TAPAS) -mallista (Herzig et al., 2020) päätellen taulukon rakenteen mallintaminen parantaa jäsentämätöntä tekstiä hyödyntävää kielimallia. Englannin Wikipedian taulukoiden esikoulutusmallit parantavat suorituskykyä entisestään. Kysymyksiin vastaamista koskevalla esikoulutuksella saraketason solusijoitustiedolla saavutetaan paras suorituskyky. Parannettujen esikoulutusten ja soluupotusten ansiosta tämä lähestymistapa ylittää huippuluokan numeerisesti tietoisen graafisen neuroverkon taulukon todentamismallin (GNN-TabFact), mikä lisää lausuntojen luokittelutarkkuutta 72,2 prosentista 73,9 prosenttiin jopa ilman numeerisen tiedon mallintamista. Numeerisen tiedon lisääminen solusijoituksiin ja ennakkokoulutukseen kysymyksiin vastaamiseen lisää tarkkuutta 76 prosenttiin. Lisäksi analysoimme tarkkuutta lauseissa, jotka sisältävät yksittäisiä rivejä tai useita taulukon rivejä ja sarakkeita, eri numeerisen päättelyn alitehtäviä sekä yleistämistä virheiden havaitsemiseksi ToTTo-taulukon tuottamisen aineistosta johdetuissa lauseissa.', 'am': 'የኢንተርኔት የስህተት መረጃዎች በማድረግ የNLP መረጃ ውይይትን ለማረጋገጥ ያበረታታል፡፡ Since writers often base their assertions on structured data, we focus here on verifying textual statements given evidence in tables.  (Herzig et al., 2020) የሠንጠረዥ ሠንጠረዥ ሠንጠረዥ የቋንቋ ሞዴል በተመሠረተ ጽሑፍ በፊት የተማረከ የቋንቋ ምሳሌ ማሻሻል እናገኘዋለን፡፡ በንግልዝኛ Wikipedia ገበታ ዳታ የፊደል የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች የድምፅ ውጤት እንዲያሳድግ ይሻላል፡፡ የጥያቄ ትምህርት በሚመልስ ስራ ላይ ትምህርት ማድረግ በዐምድ-ደረጃ የክፍል መረጃ የተሻለ ስርዓት ያገኛል፡፡ የፊደል ትምህርት እና የክፍል ግንኙነት በተሻለ ጊዜ ይህ ሥርዓት የቁጥር-ታዋቂው ግራፍ የኔural መረብ አረጋጋጭ የውይይት ማረጋገጫ ሞዴል (GNN-TabFact) ከ72.2 በመቶ እስከ 73.9 በመቶ ይጨምራል፡፡ በተጠያቂው መልስ ስራ ላይ የቁጥር መረጃ ከcell Rankings ጋር በማስጨመር እና የፊተኛውን ትምህርት በማድረግ 76 በመቶ ያበዛል። በአንድ ደረጃ ወይም በብዛት ደረጃ እና ሰንበታዎች፣ በተለየ አካላዊ ጉዳዮች፣ እና ከቶTTo ገበታ ጀምሮ እስከ ጽሑፍ ትውልድ ዳታ ማግኘት የተደረገውን ስህተቶችን ለማግኘት እናስተዋልታለን፡፡', 'sk': 'Vedno večja zaskrbljenost zaradi napačnih informacij na spletu je spodbudila raziskave NLP o preverjanju dejstev. Ker avtorji svoje trditve pogosto temeljijo na strukturiranih podatkih, se tukaj osredotočamo na preverjanje besedilnih izjav, navedenih v tabelah. Iz modela Table Parsing (TAPAS), razvitega za odgovarjanje na vprašanja (Herzig et al., 2020), ugotavljamo, da modeliranje strukture tabele izboljšuje jezikovni model, ki je vnaprej usposobljen za nestrukturirano besedilo. Predusposabljanje jezikovnih modelov na angleških Wikipedijskih tabelah dodatno izboljšuje učinkovitost. Predusposabljanje za opravilo odgovarjanja na vprašanja z informacijami o razvrstitvi celic na ravni stolpca zagotavlja najboljšo zmogljivost. Z izboljšanimi predusposabljanjem in vgradnjo celic ta pristop presega najsodobnejši model za preverjanje dejstev tabele z numerično zavedanjem grafičnega živčnega omrežja (GNN-TabFact), kar povečuje natančnost klasifikacije izjav z 72,2% na 73,9%, tudi brez modeliranja numeričnih informacij. Vključitev numeričnih informacij z razvrstitvijo celic in predusposabljanjem na nalogo odgovarjanja na vprašanja poveča natančnost na 76%. Natančnost analiziramo tudi pri izjavah, ki vključujejo eno vrstico ali več vrstic in stolpcev tabel, pri različnih podopravilih numeričnega razmišljanja in posploševanju na odkrivanje napak v izjavah, izpeljanih iz nabora podatkov za generiranje tabele v besedilo ToTTo.', 'ha': "Kijan taƙaitar da bayan information masu bastarwa na Online, yã yarda research na NLP a kan gaskiyar gaskiyar. Tana da marubũta ko da yawa, suna bincike maganar su a kan data da aka saka, munã fokusar a nan, dõmin mu gaskata bayani na rubutu da aka ba da shaidar a cikin jujjun. Ana fara daga motel mai Parse na Table (TAPAS) wanda aka buɗe wa mai tambaya (Herzig et al., 2020), za'a gane cewa, salon mai motsi na tabar da za'a kyautata wani misalin harshe da aka tsare shi da ba'a gina wani matsayi ba. @ info: whatsthis @ info: whatsthis Agar an improve shiryarwa na gabã ɗaya da aka shigar da katagon, wannan kafin yana ƙara bayani na state-of-the-art-the-art-known Graf Neural Table faktic verification (GNN-TabFact), kuma yana ƙara tsari ga classified statements daga 42.2% to 73.9% kõ da kuma bã ya samo motsi masu nufi. Ina ƙara da yawan information na ransakan cikin katagon da yin aiki na gaba-wa-tambaya yana ƙara tsari zuwa 76%. Haƙĩƙa, Munã yin ƙidãya da tsari a kan statements masu yin amfani da layuka guda ko wasu safa da layuka masu yawa, kan aikin abun masu ƙidãya masu ƙidãya, kuma kan ƙididdige gawuwa da aka gane errors cikin statements wanda ya zo daga danne-danne na-mai-matsayin Totto.", 'jv': 'Ngubah kang perbudhakan karo akeh online politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Mulai model table Nambah layang-layang tengahan anyar sampeyan kanggo data anyar wipekidya ingkang luwih bantuan ngono nggawe barang. Tarjamahan kelompok ProgressBarUpdates Inkomongke informasi sing nganggo kelompok lan ngawe kelompok tarjamahan lan sabanjur-suaraning langkung popong sing katok sabanjuré, 75%. section', 'he': 'דאגה גדולה עם מידע לא נכון באינטרנט מעודדת מחקר NLP על בדיקת עובדות. מכיוון שכותבים לעתים קרובות מבססים את הצהרות שלהם על נתונים מבוססים, אנחנו מתמקדים כאן באמת הצהרות טקסטיות שנתנו ראיות בשולחנות. בהתחלה מהדוגמא של בדיקת השולחן (TAPAS) שפותחת לענות על שאלות (Herzig et al., 2020), אנו מוצאים שמבנה של דוגמא שולחן משפר דוגמא שפה מאומנת מראש על טקסט לא מבושל. דוגמנים לשפה הקדמית על מידע שולחן ויקיפדיה אנגלית משפר את ההופעה. האימונים הקדמיים על משימה לענות על שאלות עם מידע רמה תאי עמוד משיגים את ההופעה הטובה ביותר. With improved pre-training and cell embeddings, this approach outperforms the state-of-the-art Numerically-aware Graph Neural Network table fact verification model (GNN-TabFact), increasing statement classification accuracy from 72.2% to 73.9% even without modeling numerical information.  הכילוי מידע מספרי עם רמות תאים ואימון מראש על משימה לענות על שאלות מגבירה מדויקה ל-76%. אנו נוספים לנתח מדויקת על הצהרות שמעסקות בשורות יחידות או שורות רבות וצורות של שולחנות, על תחתיות הגיון מספריות שונות, וכך על הגנרליזציה לגילוי טעויות בהצהרות שנוצאות מהקבוצת מידע של שולחן טוטו-לטקסט.', 'bo': 'Growing concern with online misinformation has encouraged NLP research on fact verification. རྩོམ་པ་པོ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ནས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ན། ང་ཚོས་དེ་ནས་ཡིག Starting from the Table Parsing (TAPAS) model developed for question answering (Herzig et al., 2020), we find that modeling table structure improves a language model pre-trained on unstructured text. དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་སྒེར་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་མང་ཙམ་འགྱུར་བ་བཏང་བ་རེད། གྱེན་ཕྲེང་གི་སྐོར་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་རྗེས་སུ་འཇུག་པའི་ལས་གནད་དོན་གྱི་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག With improved pre-training and cell embeddings, this approach outperforms the state-of-the-art Numerically-aware Graph Neural Network table fact verification model (GNN-TabFact), increasing statement classification accuracy from 72.2% to 73.9% even without modeling numerical information. སྒེའུ་ཁུང་གི་གྲངས་ཀ་གཙོ་རིམ་དང་གནས་ཚུལ་སྔོན་གྲངས་ཀ་དུ་བཙུགས་བཞིན་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང We further analyze accuracy on statements implicating single rows or multiple rows and columns of tables, on different numerical reasoning subtasks, and on generalizing to detect errors in statements derived from the ToTTo table-to-text generation dataset.'}
{'en': 'Cross-Cultural Similarity Features for Cross-Lingual Transfer Learning of Pragmatically Motivated Tasks', 'ar': 'ميزات التشابه بين الثقافات لنقل التعلم عبر اللغات للمهام ذات الدوافع العملية', 'pt': 'Recursos de semelhança intercultural para aprendizagem de transferência interlinguística de tarefas pragmaticamente motivadas', 'es': 'Características de similitud transcultural para el aprendizaje de transferencia multilingüe de tareas motivadas pragmáticamente', 'fr': "Caractéristiques de similitude interculturelle pour l'apprentissage par transfert interlinguistique de tâches motivées par le pragmatisme", 'ja': '実用的に動機付けられたタスクのクロスリンガル転送学習のための異文化間の類似性機能', 'zh': '语言迁学跨文化相似性特征', 'ru': 'Особенности кросс-культурного сходства для кросс-лингвального трансферного обучения прагматически мотивированных задач', 'hi': 'पार सांस्कृतिक समानता व्यावहारिक रूप से प्रेरित कार्यों के क्रॉस-लिंगुअल ट्रांसफर लर्निंग के लिए विशेषताएं', 'ga': "Gnéithe Cosúlachta Traschultúrtha d'Fhoghlaim Trastheangacha ar Thascanna Spreagtha Pragmatacha", 'ka': 'ძირითადი კულტურურური სინამდვილეობის ფუნქციები პრაგმატიკურად მოტოვირებული დავალებების შესწავლებისთვის', 'hu': 'Kultúraközi hasonlósági funkciók a gyakorlatilag motivált feladatok nyelvközi transzfertanulásához', 'el': 'Χαρακτηριστικά διαπολιτισμικής ομοιομορφίας για τη δια-γλωσσική μεταφορά εκμάθησης πρακτικών κινητοποιημένων εργασιών', 'it': "Caratteristiche di somiglianza interculturale per l'apprendimento translinguistico dei compiti pragmaticamente motivati", 'kk': 'Прагматикалық жылжытылған тапсырмаларды оқыту үшін бірнеше мәдениеттің ұқсас қасиеттері', 'lt': 'Cross-Cultural Similarity Features for Cross-Lingual Transfer Learning of Pragmatically Motivated Tasks', 'ms': 'Ciri-ciri Persamaan Berbudaya Selasa untuk Pemindahan Selasa-Bahasa Mempelajari Tugas Bermotif Pragmatik', 'mk': 'Кроскултурна сличност на објектите за трансферсно учење на прагматски мотивирани задачи', 'mt': 'Karatteristiċi ta’ Similarità Transkulturali għal Tagħlim Transkonfinali ta’ Kompiti Motivati Pragmatikament', 'mn': 'Дөрвөн соёлын төстэй төстэй төстэй харьцуулалтын төстэй боломжууд Прагматик хөдөлгөөнтэй ажил суралцах', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്- ലിങ്ഗല്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതിനുള്ള ക്രോസ്- സംസ്കാരത്തിലെ സമമായ വിശിഷ്ടമങ്ങള്\u200d', 'no': 'Kryskulturelle liknande funksjonar for å læra krysslingsoverføringar av pragmatisk motivert oppgåver', 'pl': 'Funkcje podobieństwa międzykulturowego dla uczenia się transferu międzykulturowego pragmatycznie motywowanych zadań', 'ro': 'Caracteristici de similitudine interculturală pentru învățarea translingvistică a sarcinilor motivate pragmatic', 'sr': 'Krstokulturna sličnost karakteristika prijenosa preko jezika učenje pragmatički motiviranih zadataka', 'si': 'Cross-Lingual Transfer Training of Pragmatical Motive Jobs', 'so': 'Cross-Cultural Similarity Features for Cross-Lingual Transfer Learning of Pragmatically Motivated Tasks', 'sv': 'Tverkulturella likhetsfunktioner för tvärspråklig överföring av Pragmatiskt motiverade uppgifter', 'ta': 'கிராஸ்- கோட்டு மாற்றும் கற்றுக்கான கிராஸ்- கலாச்சார ஒத்திருப்பு பணிகள்', 'ur': 'Cross-Lingual Transfer Learning of Pragmatically Motivated Tasks for Cross-Cultural Similarity Features for Cross-Lingual Transfer', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name Lý do ví dụ:', 'hr': 'Međukulturna sličnost za učenje pragmatički motiviranih zadataka međuLingualnog prijenosa', 'nl': 'Interculturele gelijkeniskenmerken voor het leren van pragmatisch gemotiveerde taken tussen talen en talen', 'bg': 'Характеристики за междукултурно сходство при междулингвистично трансферно обучение на прагматично мотивирани задачи', 'da': 'Tværkulturelle lighedsfunktioner til tværsproget overførsel af praktiske motiverede opgaver', 'fa': 'ویژه\u200cهای شبیه\u200cانگیز فرهنگی برای انتقال متصل زبان\u200cهای متصل یادگیری از کار\u200cهای حرکت\u200cکننده\u200cی Pragmatically', 'tr': 'Cross-Cultural Similarity Features for Cross-Lingual Transfer Learning of Pragmatically Motivated Tasks', 'sw': 'Tamko sawa na Utamaduni kwa ajili ya Uhamiaji wa Kirusi na Ufunzi wa Mipango', 'de': 'Interkulturelle Ähnlichkeitsmerkmale für das sprachübergreifende Transferlernen pragmatisch motivierter Aufgaben', 'af': 'Cross-Cultural Similarity Features for Cross-Lingual Transfer Learning of Pragmatically Motivated Tasks', 'id': 'Ciri-ciri Persamaan Berbudaya Selatan untuk Pembelajaran Transfer Lingua Selatan dari Tugas Bermotif Pragmatis', 'ko': '언어용 동기 임무 크로스 언어 이동 학습의 크로스 문화 유사성 특징', 'sq': 'Karakteristikat e ngjashmërisë ndërkulturore për mësimin ndër-gjuhësor të detyrave të motivuara praktikisht', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Խաղաժիշտ մոտիվացված խնդիրների միջլեզվային փոխանցման հատկությունները', 'az': 'Pragmatik hərəkət edilmiş işlərin öyrənməsi üçün çox-kültürlük Similarlıq Özellikləri', 'bn': 'Cross-Cultural Similarity Features for Cross-Lingual Transfer Learning of Pragmatically Motivated Tasks', 'bs': 'Međukulturna sličnost za učenje pragmatički motiviranih zadataka preko linije', 'cs': 'Mezikulturní podobnostní funkce pro mezijazyčný transfer učení pragmaticky motivovaných úkolů', 'ca': 'Característiques de similitud transcultural per aprendre transferències translingües de tasques pragmàticament motivades', 'et': 'Kultuuridevahelise sarnasuse omadused pragmaatiliselt motiveeritud ülesannete keeleüleseks siirdeks', 'fi': 'Kulttuurienvälisen samankaltaisuuden ominaisuudet kielienvälisessä siirtooppimisessa pragmaattisesti motivoituneissa tehtävissä', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'תמונות דמיון בין תרבות ללימודי העברה בין שפתיים של משימות מוטיבציות', 'sk': 'Medkulturne podobnosti značilnosti za medjezikovno prenosno učenje pragmatično motiviranih nalog', 'bo': 'Cross-Cultural Similarity Features for Cross-Lingual Transfer Learning of Pragmatically Motivated Tasks'}
{'en': 'Much work in cross-lingual transfer learning explored how to select better transfer languages for multilingual tasks, primarily focusing on typological and genealogical similarities between languages. We hypothesize that these measures of linguistic proximity are not enough when working with pragmatically-motivated tasks, such as sentiment analysis. As an alternative, we introduce three linguistic features that capture cross-cultural similarities that manifest in linguistic patterns and quantify distinct aspects of language pragmatics : language context-level, figurative language, and the lexification of emotion concepts. Our analyses show that the proposed pragmatic features do capture cross-cultural similarities and align well with existing work in sociolinguistics and linguistic anthropology. We further corroborate the effectiveness of pragmatically-driven transfer in the downstream task of choosing transfer languages for cross-lingual sentiment analysis.', 'ar': 'اكتشف الكثير من العمل في تعلم النقل عبر اللغات كيفية اختيار لغات نقل أفضل للمهام متعددة اللغات ، مع التركيز بشكل أساسي على أوجه التشابه بين اللغات. نحن نفترض أن مقاييس القرب اللغوي هذه ليست كافية عند العمل مع المهام ذات الدوافع البراغماتية ، مثل تحليل المشاعر. كبديل ، نقدم ثلاث ميزات لغوية تلتقط أوجه التشابه بين الثقافات التي تظهر في الأنماط اللغوية وتحدد جوانب مميزة للبراغماتية اللغوية: مستوى سياق اللغة ، واللغة التصويرية ، وترجمة مفاهيم المشاعر. تُظهر تحليلاتنا أن الميزات البراغماتية المقترحة تلتقط أوجه التشابه بين الثقافات وتتوافق جيدًا مع العمل الحالي في علم اللغة الاجتماعي والأنثروبولوجيا اللغوية. نحن نؤيد كذلك فعالية النقل المدفوع براغماتي في المهمة النهائية لاختيار لغات النقل لتحليل المشاعر عبر اللغات.', 'fr': "De nombreux travaux dans le domaine de l'apprentissage par transfert interlinguistique ont exploré la manière de sélectionner de meilleures langues de transfert pour les tâches multilingues, en mettant l'accent sur les similitudes typologiques et généalogiques entre les langues. Nous émettons l'hypothèse que ces mesures de proximité linguistique ne suffisent pas lorsque l'on travaille avec des tâches motivées par le pragmatisme, telles que l'analyse des sentiments. Comme alternative, nous introduisons trois caractéristiques linguistiques qui capturent les similitudes interculturelles qui se manifestent dans les modèles linguistiques et quantifient des aspects distincts de la pragmatique linguistique\xa0: le niveau du contexte linguistique, le langage figuré et la lexification des concepts émotionnels. Nos analyses montrent que les caractéristiques pragmatiques proposées saisissent les similitudes interculturelles et s'alignent bien avec les travaux existants en sociolinguistique et en anthropologie linguistique. Nous corroborons également l'efficacité du transfert pragmatique dans la tâche en aval consistant à choisir les langues de transfert pour l'analyse des sentiments multilingues.", 'es': 'Gran parte del trabajo en el aprendizaje de transferencia multilingüe exploró cómo seleccionar mejores idiomas de transferencia para tareas multilingües, centrándose principalmente en las similitudes tipológicas y genealógicas entre idiomas. Planteamos la hipótesis de que estas medidas de proximidad lingüística no son suficientes cuando se trabaja con tareas de motivación pragmática, como el análisis de sentimientos. Como alternativa, introducimos tres características lingüísticas que capturan las similitudes transculturales que se manifiestan en los patrones lingüísticos y cuantifican los distintos aspectos de la pragmática del lenguaje: el nivel del contexto del lenguaje, el lenguaje figurativo y la lexificación de los conceptos de emociones. Nuestros análisis muestran que las características pragmáticas propuestas captan similitudes transculturales y se alinean bien con el trabajo existente en sociolingüística y antropología lingüística. Además, corroboramos la eficacia de la transferencia impulsada pragmáticamente en la tarea descendente de elegir los idiomas de transferencia para el análisis de sentimientos multilingües.', 'pt': 'Muito trabalho em aprendizagem de transferência multilíngue explorou como selecionar melhores idiomas de transferência para tarefas multilíngues, concentrando-se principalmente nas semelhanças tipológicas e genealógicas entre os idiomas. Nossa hipótese é que essas medidas de proximidade linguística não são suficientes quando se trabalha com tarefas pragmaticamente motivadas, como a análise de sentimentos. Como alternativa, apresentamos três características linguísticas que capturam semelhanças interculturais que se manifestam em padrões linguísticos e quantificam aspectos distintos da pragmática da linguagem: nível de contexto da linguagem, linguagem figurada e a lexificação de conceitos de emoção. Nossas análises mostram que as características pragmáticas propostas capturam semelhanças interculturais e se alinham bem com o trabalho existente em sociolinguística e antropologia linguística. Além disso, corroboramos a eficácia da transferência orientada pragmaticamente na tarefa downstream de escolher idiomas de transferência para análise de sentimentos entre idiomas.', 'ja': 'クロスリンガル転送学習の多くの研究は、主に言語間の類型的および系譜的類似性に焦点を当てて、多言語タスクのためにより良い転送言語を選択する方法を探求した。私たちは、感情分析などの実用的に動機づけられたタスクに取り組む場合、これらの言語的近接性の尺度は十分ではないと仮定しています。代替として、私たちは、言語パターンに現れ、言語実用性の異なる側面を定量化する異文化間の類似性を取り込む3つの言語学的特徴を紹介します。言語文脈レベル、比喩的言語、感情概念の辞書化です。私たちの分析によると、提案された実用的な特徴は、異文化間の類似性を捉え、社会言語学と言語人類学の既存の研究とうまく一致していることが示されています。私たちは、クロスリンガル感情分析のために転送言語を選択するという下流のタスクにおける実用的に駆動された転送の有効性をさらに裏付けています。', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-लिंगुअल ट्रांसफर लर्निंग में बहुत काम ने यह पता लगाया कि बहुभाषी कार्यों के लिए बेहतर हस्तांतरण भाषाओं का चयन कैसे किया जाए, मुख्य रूप से भाषाओं के बीच टाइपोलॉजिकल और वंशावली समानताओं पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया जाए। हम परिकल्पना करते हैं कि भाषाई निकटता के ये उपाय व्यावहारिक रूप से प्रेरित कार्यों के साथ काम करते समय पर्याप्त नहीं हैं, जैसे कि भावना विश्लेषण। एक विकल्प के रूप में, हम तीन भाषाई विशेषताओं को पेश करते हैं जो पार-सांस्कृतिक समानताओं को कैप्चर करते हैं जो भाषाई पैटर्न में प्रकट होते हैं और भाषा व्यावहारिकता के अलग-अलग पहलुओं को निर्धारित करते हैं: भाषा संदर्भ-स्तर, आलंकारिक भाषा, और भावना अवधारणाओं का लेक्सिफिकेशन। हमारे विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित व्यावहारिक विशेषताएं पार-सांस्कृतिक समानताओं को कैप्चर करती हैं और समाजभाषाविज्ञान और भाषाई नृविज्ञान में मौजूदा काम के साथ अच्छी तरह से संरेखित करती हैं। हम आगे क्रॉस-लिंगुअल भावना विश्लेषण के लिए स्थानांतरण भाषाओं को चुनने के डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्य में व्यावहारिक रूप से संचालित हस्तांतरण की प्रभावशीलता की पुष्टि करते हैं।', 'zh': '语言迁学之多端,择其善者而言之,要在言语之间类型学与谱相似性。 设之以机务(情析)时,言近度量不足。 为代方案,引入三语特征,获语式之跨文化相似性,并量化语言语用学之异:言语上下文平,喻言情之词汇化。 臣等分析表明,实用特征,实得跨文化相似性,与世语言学语人类学见事大合。 益证务实之移于择移言之有效性。', 'ru': 'Значительная работа в области межязыкового трансферного обучения была посвящена изучению вопроса о том, как лучше выбирать языки для выполнения многоязычных задач, уделяя основное внимание типологическим и генеалогическим сходствам между языками. Мы предполагаем, что этих мер языковой близости недостаточно при работе с прагматически мотивированными задачами, такими как анализ настроений. В качестве альтернативы мы вводим три лингвистических признака, которые отражают кросс-культурное сходство, проявляющееся в языковых паттернах, и количественно определяют различные аспекты языковой прагматики: языковой контекст, образный язык и лексификацию концепций эмоций. Наши анализы показывают, что предлагаемые прагматические особенности действительно отражают кросс-культурное сходство и хорошо согласуются с существующей работой в области социолингвистики и лингвистической антропологии. Мы далее подтверждаем эффективность прагматически управляемой передачи в задаче последующего выбора языков передачи для анализа межязыковых настроений.', 'ga': 'Scrúdaíodh go leor oibre san fhoghlaim aistrithe tras-teanga conas teangacha aistrithe níos fearr a roghnú le haghaidh tascanna ilteangacha, ag díriú go príomha ar chosúlachtaí tíopeolaíochta agus ginealais idir teangacha. Tugaimid hipitéis nach leor na tomhais seo maidir le cóngaracht teanga agus sinn ag obair le tascanna pragmatach-spreagtha, mar anailís meoin. Mar mhalairt air sin, tugaimid isteach trí ghné theangeolaíocha a ghlacann cosúlachtaí traschultúrtha a léirítear i bpatrúin theangeolaíocha agus a chainníochtaíonn gnéithe ar leith de phragmataic teanga: leibhéal comhthéacs teanga, teanga fhíoraíoch, agus foclóireacht choincheapa na mothúchán. Léiríonn ár n-anailísí go bhfuil cosúlachtaí traschultúrtha ag gabháil leis na gnéithe pragmatacha atá beartaithe agus go bhfuil siad ag teacht go maith leis an obair atá ar bun sa tsochtheangeolaíocht agus san antraipeolaíocht theangeolaíoch. Tacaímid freisin le héifeachtúlacht aistrithe pragmatach sa tasc iartheachtach de theangacha aistrithe a roghnú le haghaidh anailíse tras-teangacha ar mheonchainteoirí.', 'ka': 'ძალიან მრავალური ტრანსტრენსის სწავლებაში მრავალური სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო ენები ჩვენ ჰიპოტესტიზებთ, რომ ეს ლენგმისტიკური პრობლექტიკის მეტრები არ არის достатоფერი, როდესაც პრაგმატიკურად მოტივირებული დავალებით, როგორც სენტიმენტიკური ანალიზ როგორც ალტენტიფიკაცია, ჩვენ სამი ლენგურისტიკური ფუნქციების შესახებ, რომლებიც კრისიკულტური სხვადასხვების შესახებ, რომლებიც ლენგურისტიკური ფუნქციებში გამოჩვენებენ და კვანტიფიკაციის განსხვავებული პრაგმატიკური ჩვენი ანალიზები აჩვენებენ, რომ პრაგმატიკური განსაზღვრებები გააკეთებენ კულტურულური სინამდვილეობებით და სოციოლოლისტიკური ანტეპოლოგიაში მუშაობაში მუშაობაში მუშ ჩვენ უფრო კოპორბურაცით პრაგმატიკურად მოწყობინებული ტრანსტრენსის ეფექტიურობას, რომელიც ჩვენ ჩვენ წინაღებული ტრანსტრენსი ენათების გაირჩევა კრესი', 'el': 'Πολλές εργασίες στην εκμάθηση της διασυνοριακής μεταφοράς εξερεύνησαν τον τρόπο επιλογής καλύτερων γλωσσών μεταφοράς για πολυγλωσσικές εργασίες, εστιάζοντας κυρίως στις τυπολογικές και γενεαλογικές ομοιότητες μεταξύ των γλωσσών. Υποθέτουμε ότι αυτά τα μέτρα γλωσσικής εγγύτητας δεν είναι αρκετά όταν εργαζόμαστε με καθήκοντα με ρεαλιστικά κίνητρα, όπως η ανάλυση συναισθημάτων. Εναλλακτικά, εισάγουμε τρία γλωσσικά χαρακτηριστικά που αποτυπώνουν διαπολιτισμικές ομοιότητες που εκδηλώνονται στα γλωσσικά πρότυπα και ποσοτικοποιούν διακριτές πτυχές της γλωσσικής πραγματιστικής: γλωσσικό πλαίσιο, εικονιστική γλώσσα και λεξιοποίηση εννοιών συναισθημάτων. Οι αναλύσεις μας δείχνουν ότι τα προτεινόμενα πραγματιστικά χαρακτηριστικά αποτυπώνουν διαπολιτισμικές ομοιότητες και ευθυγραμμίζονται καλά με την υπάρχουσα εργασία στην κοινωνιογλωσσολογία και τη γλωσσική ανθρωπολογία. Επιβεβαιώνουμε περαιτέρω την αποτελεσματικότητα της πρακτικά καθοδηγούμενης μεταφοράς στο μεταγενέστερο έργο επιλογής γλωσσών μεταφοράς για ανάλυση γλωσσικών συναισθημάτων.', 'hu': 'A többnyelvű transzfer tanulásban végzett sok munka azt vizsgálta, hogyan lehet jobb transzfer nyelveket kiválasztani a többnyelvű feladatokhoz, elsősorban a nyelvek tipológiai és genealógiai hasonlóságaira összpontosítva. Feltételezzük, hogy a nyelvi közelség ezen mérései nem elegendőek pragmatikusan motivált feladatokkal, mint például az érzelmek elemzésével. Alternatívaként három nyelvi jellemzőt mutatunk be, amelyek megragadják a kultúrák közötti hasonlóságokat, amelyek nyelvi mintákban nyilvánulnak meg, és számszerűsítik a nyelvpragmatika különböző aspektusait: nyelvi kontextusszintű, figuratív nyelv és az érzelmi fogalmak lexikálása. Elemzéseink azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt pragmatikus vonások kulturális közötti hasonlóságokat ragadnak meg, és jól illeszkednek a szociolingészet és a nyelvantropológia területén meglévő munkákhoz. Továbbá alátámasztjuk a gyakorlatilag vezérelt transzfer hatékonyságát a transzfer nyelvek kiválasztásának downstream feladatában a többnyelvű hangulatelemzéshez.', 'it': "Molto lavoro nell'apprendimento translinguale di trasferimento ha esplorato come selezionare migliori lingue di trasferimento per compiti multilingue, concentrandosi principalmente sulle somiglianze tipologiche e genealogiche tra le lingue. Ipotizziamo che queste misure di prossimità linguistica non siano sufficienti quando si lavora con compiti motivati pragmaticamente, come l'analisi del sentiment. In alternativa, introduciamo tre caratteristiche linguistiche che catturano somiglianze interculturali che si manifestano nei modelli linguistici e quantificano aspetti distinti della pragmatica linguistica: livello di contesto linguistico, linguaggio figurativo e lessificazione dei concetti emotivi. Le nostre analisi mostrano che le caratteristiche pragmatiche proposte catturano somiglianze interculturali e si allineano bene con il lavoro esistente in sociolinguistica e antropologia linguistica. Confermiamo inoltre l'efficacia del trasferimento pragmatico nel compito a valle della scelta dei linguaggi di trasferimento per l'analisi cross-lingual sentiment.", 'kk': 'Көпшілік тілдерді аудару оқыту үшін көп жұмыс көпшілікті көпшілік тілдерді көпшілік тапсырмалар үшін таңдау тілдерін қалай таңдау керектігін зерттеді, негізінде тілдер ара Біз бұл лингвистикалық жақындылық өлшемдері прагматикалық мотивациялық тапсырмаларымен жұмыс істегенде жеткілікті емес деп ойлаймыз. Альтернативті түрде, біз үш тіл контексті деңгейі, фигурациялық тіл және эмоциялық концепцияларының лексификациясын көрсету үшін мәдениеттік ұқсастықтарын көрсетеді. Біздің анализациямыз қолданылатын прагматикалық мүмкіндіктері көптеген мәдениеттердің ұқсастығын алып, социололингвистикалық мен лингвистикалық антропологиялық жұмыстарымен жақсы түзетуді көрсе Біз көптеген тілдерді көптеген сезімдерді анализ үшін аудару тілдерін таңдау тапсырмасында прагматикалық көмегімен көмектесетін аудару мүмкіндігін баптаймыз.', 'lt': 'Daug darbo vykdant tarpkalbinį mokymąsi buvo tiriama, kaip geriau pasirinkti daugiakalbes užduotis perduodančias kalbas, daugiausia dėmesio skiriant tipologiniams ir genealoginiams kalbų panašumams. We hypothesize that these measures of linguistic proximity are not enough when working with pragmatically-motivated tasks, such as sentiment analysis.  As an alternative, we introduce three linguistic features that capture cross-cultural similarities that manifest in linguistic patterns and quantify distinct aspects of language pragmatics: language context-level, figurative language, and the lexification of emotion concepts.  Our analyses show that the proposed pragmatic features do capture cross-cultural similarities and align well with existing work in sociolinguistics and linguistic anthropology.  We further corroborate the effectiveness of pragmatically-driven transfer in the downstream task of choosing transfer languages for cross-lingual sentiment analysis.', 'mk': 'Much work in cross-lingual transfer learning explored how to select better transfer languages for multilingual tasks, primarily focusing on typological and genealogical similarities between languages.  Ние хипотезираме дека овие мерки на јазична близина не се доволни кога работиме со прагматски мотивирани задачи, како што е анализата на чувствата. As an alternative, we introduce three linguistic features that capture cross-cultural similarities that manifest in linguistic patterns and quantify distinct aspects of language pragmatics: language context-level, figurative language, and the lexification of emotion concepts.  Our analyses show that the proposed pragmatic features do capture cross-cultural similarities and align well with existing work in sociolinguistics and linguistic anthropology.  We further corroborate the effectiveness of pragmatically-driven transfer in the downstream task of choosing transfer languages for cross-lingual sentiment analysis.', 'ms': 'Much work in cross-lingual transfer learning explored how to select better transfer languages for multilingual tasks, primarily focusing on typological and genealogical similarities between languages.  We hypothesize that these measures of linguistic proximity are not enough when working with pragmatically-motivated tasks, such as sentiment analysis.  As an alternative, we introduce three linguistic features that capture cross-cultural similarities that manifest in linguistic patterns and quantify distinct aspects of language pragmatics: language context-level, figurative language, and the lexification of emotion concepts.  Analisis kami menunjukkan bahawa ciri-ciri pragmatik yang diusulkan menangkap persamaan budaya-budaya dan menyesuaikan dengan baik dengan kerja yang wujud dalam sosiolingvistik dan antropologi bahasa. Kami mengesahkan lebih lanjut kegunaan pemindahan pragmatik dalam tugas turun untuk memilih bahasa pemindahan untuk analisis perasaan saling bahasa.', 'mn': 'Ихэнх хэл шилжүүлэх сургалтын маш олон ажил олон хэл даалгаварын тулд илүү сайн шилжүүлэх хэл сонгохыг судалсан, ихэнх нь хэл хоорондын типтологик болон генералогийн төстэй төстэй байдаг. Бид хэлний ойролцоогоор байгаа хэмжээсүүд нь прагматик сэтгэл хөдлөлтэй ажиллагаатай ажиллах үед хангалттай биш гэж боддог. Өөрөөр хэлбэл бид хэлний прагматикийн ялгаатай талаар хэлний төвшин, төлөвлөгөө хэл, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн төвшин, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн төлөвлөгөөг тодорхойлж буй олон соёл соёлын төрөлхтний гурван хэлний төлөвлөгөөг танилцуулдаг. Бидний шинжилгээний талаар сургалтын прагматикийн хувьд соёл соёлын төстэй адилаар холбогдож, социологийн хэлний, хэлний antropology дээр байгаа ажилтай сайн холбогдож байгааг харуулдаг. Бид дахиад хэлний мэдрэмжүүдийн шинжилгээнд шилжүүлэх хэлний шинжилгээ сонгохын тулд прагматик хөдөлгөөний үр дүнг дэмждэг.', 'ml': 'ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ ജോലികള്\u200dക്കായി മികച്ച ഭാഷകള്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നത് എങ്ങനെയാണെന്ന് പരിശോധിച്ചു, പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d ടൈപ്പോളജിക്കല്\u200d  ഈ ഭാഷകസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ അടുത്തുള്ള മെച്ചപ്പെട്ട പരിപാടികള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി ജോലി ചെയ്യുമ്പോള്\u200d പ്രചോദിക്കുന്നതിന് മതിയാവ മറ്റൊരു വിദ്യാഭാഷയായി മൂന്നു ഭാഷകങ്ങളെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത് ക്രിസ്കാരികസംസ്കാരത്തിന്റെ തുല്യമായ മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d പിടികൂടുന്നു. ഭാഷയുടെ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകളില്\u200d വ് നമ്മുടെ അന്വേഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് പ്രൊഗ്മാനിക്കാനുള്ള പ്രായോഗ്രാമിക്കിറ്റിക്കാരുടെ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സംസ്കാരത്തിലുള്ള നമ്മള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200d ക്രിസ്ലിങ്ങ് ഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നതിനായി തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രായാഗ്രാമിക്കല്\u200d മ', 'mt': 'Ħafna xogħol fit-tagħlim tat-trasferiment translingwi esplora kif jintgħażlu lingwi ta’ trasferiment aħjar għal kompiti multilingwi, b’enfasi primarja fuq similaritajiet tipoloġiċi u ġenealoġiċi bejn il-lingwi. Aħna niipotesizzaw li dawn il-miżuri ta’ viċinanza lingwistika mhumiex biżżejjed meta naħdmu ma’ kompiti motivati prammatikament, bħall-analiżi tas-sentimenti. Bħala alternattiva, aħna nintroduċu tliet karatteristiċi lingwistiċi li jaqbdu similaritajiet transkulturali li jidhru f’mudelli lingwistiċi u jikkwantifikaw aspetti distinti tal-pragmatika lingwistika: livell ta’ kuntest lingwistiku, lingwa figurattiva, u l-lexifikazzjoni ta’ kunċetti emozzjonali. L-analiżi tagħna turi li l-karatteristiċi prammatiċi proposti jaqbdu similaritajiet transkulturali u jallinjaw tajjeb max-xogħol eżistenti fl-antropoloġija soċjo-lingwistika u lingwistika. Aħna nkorroboraw ukoll l-effettività tat-trasferiment immexxi pragmatikament fil-kompitu downstream li jagħżel lingwi ta’ trasferiment għall-analiżi tas-sentimenti translingwi.', 'no': 'Mange arbeid i læring av krysspråk overføring er utforska korleis å velja bedre overføringspråk for fleirspråk, hovudsakelig fokuserer på typologiske og genealogske liknande mellom språk. Vi hypotiserer at desse målene av språkstiske tilnærminga er ikkje nok når det arbeider med pragmatisk motivert oppgåver, som sentimentanalyser. Som alternativ introduserer vi tre lingviske funksjonar som inneheld kryskulturelle likningar som manifesterer i lingviske mønsterer og kvantifiserer forskjellige aspektar av språk pragmatikk: språk-kontekstnivå, figurativ språk og leksifisering av emosjonske konseptar. Analysene våre viser at den foreslåde pragmatiske funksjonane inneholder kryskulturelle liknande og rettar opp med eksisterande arbeid i sosiallingvistiske og lingvistiske antropologi. Vi korriberer framover effektiviteten av pragmatisk-drivt overføring i nedtrekkoppgåva for å velja overføringspråk for krysspråk-sentimentanalyser.', 'pl': 'Wiele prac nad uczeniem się transferu wielojęzycznego badało, jak wybrać lepsze języki transferowe do zadań wielojęzycznych, skupiając się przede wszystkim na typologicznych i genealogicznych podobieństwach między językami. Zakładamy hipotezę, że te miary bliskości językowej nie są wystarczające przy praktycznie zmotywowanych zadaniach, takich jak analiza sentymentów. Alternatywnie wprowadzamy trzy cechy językowe, które uwzględniają podobieństwa międzykulturowe, które przejawiają się w wzorcach językowych i kwantyfikują odrębne aspekty pragmatyki językowej: poziom kontekstu językowego, język figuratywny oraz leksyfikację koncepcji emocji. Nasze analizy pokazują, że proponowane cechy pragmatyczne uwzględniają podobieństwa międzykulturowe i dostosowują się do istniejących prac w dziedzinie socjolingwistyki i antropologii językowej. Potwierdzamy również skuteczność pragmatycznego transferu w dalszym zadaniu wyboru języków transferowych do analizy sentymentów między językami.', 'ro': 'Multe lucrări în domeniul învățării translingvistice au explorat modul de selectare a limbilor de transfer mai bune pentru sarcini multilingve, concentrându-se în principal pe similitudinile tipologice și genealogice dintre limbi. Ipotezăm că aceste măsuri de proximitate lingvistică nu sunt suficiente atunci când lucrăm cu sarcini motivate pragmatic, cum ar fi analiza sentimentului. Ca alternativă, introducem trei caracteristici lingvistice care captează asemănări interculturale care se manifestă în modelele lingvistice și cuantifică aspecte distincte ale pragmaticii lingvistice: contextul lingvistic, limbajul figurativ și lexificarea conceptelor emoționale. Analizele noastre arată că trăsăturile pragmatice propuse captează asemănări interculturale și se aliniază bine cu activitatea existentă în sociolingvistică și antropologie lingvistică. Confirmăm în continuare eficacitatea transferului orientat pragmatic în sarcina din aval de a alege limbile de transfer pentru analiza sentimentului translingvistic.', 'sr': 'Mnogo posla u prevođenju preko jezika istražilo je kako odabrati bolje prevođenje jezika za višejezičke zadatke, uglavnom fokusiranje na tipološke i genealogske sličnosti između jezika. Pretpostavljamo da ove mjere jezičke bliskosti nisu dovoljne kada rade sa pragmatički motiviranim zadacima, poput analize sentimenta. Kao alternativa, predstavljamo tri jezičke karakteristike koje uključuju međukulturne sličnosti koje se pojavljuju u jezičkim obrascima i kvantificiraju različite aspekte jezičke pragmatike: jezički kontekstski nivo, figurativni jezik i leksifikacija emocionalnih koncepta. Naši analizi pokazuju da predložene pragmatične karakteristike uhvate međukulturne sličnosti i dobro se slažu sa postojećim radom u sociolilingvističkoj i lingvističkoj antropologiji. Dalje potvrđujemo učinkovitost pragmatički vođenog prenošenja u donjem zadatku biranja jezika prijenosa za analizu međujezika sentimenta.', 'si': 'විශාල භාෂාවික ස්ථානයේ ගොඩක් වැඩ කරනවා කොහොමද විශාල භාෂාවික වැඩ කරන්නේ හොඳ ස්ථානය භාෂාවක් තෝරගන්නේ කියල අපි හිතන්නේ මේ භාෂාවික විශ්වාසයේ මාර්ගයක් ප්\u200dරාග්මිතික විශ්වාසයෙන් වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් නෑ කියලා. වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන්, අපි භාෂාවික භාෂාවික අවශ්\u200dය තුනක් අරගෙන ඉන්නවා ඒ වගේම භාෂාවික වර්ගයෙන් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා වගේම භාෂාවික වර්ගයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාශ අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරාග්මතික විශේෂතාවල් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා සමාජ්\u200dය භාෂාවික සහ භාෂාවික විශ අපි තවත් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා ප්\u200dරාග්මාටිකියික විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා භාෂාවන්ත භාෂාව තෝරාගන්නේ ප්\u200dරති', 'so': 'Waxbarashada luuqadaha kala duduwan shaqo badan ayaa baaraandegay sida aad u dooratid luuqadaha si wanaagsan loogu beddelo shaqooyinka luuqadaha kala duduwan, sida ugu horeysa waxay ku kalsoonaadaan tusaale ahaan iyo isku mid ah luuqadaha dhexdooda. Waxaynu ka fekernaa in qiyaastii ku dhowaanshada luuqadaha ma filna marka la shaqeynayo shaqooyin la isticmaalo, tusaale ahaan baaritaanka fikradda. Sida kale waxaan u soo bandhignaa saddex noocyo oo luuqad ah oo qabsada isku mid ah dhaqanka kala duduwan oo ku muuqata noocyada luuqada luuqadda, waxaana koobnaa dhinacyo kala duduwan oo kala duduwan oo ku saabsan hadalka afka: heerka kooxda luuqada, luuqada takhasuska iyo fikrada fikrada. Analyadaada waxay muuqataa in tababarada la soo jeeday ay ay qabsadaan similar dhaqamada kala duduwan, oo ay si wanaagsan u hagaajiyaan shaqada ku jira bulshada iyo dhaqanka luuqadda. Waxaynu kaloo sameynaynaa shaqaalaha la wareejiyo dhaqdhaqaaqa hoose ee lagu dooranayo luuqadaha la beddelo si loo baarito fikrada luuqadaha kala duwan.', 'ta': 'Much work in cross-lingual transfer learning explored how to select better transfer languages for multilingual tasks, primarily focusing on typological and genealogical similarities between languages.  நாம் இந்த மொழியில் நெருக்கமான அளவு மாற்றியாக மூன்று மொழி குணங்களை நாம் குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். இது மொழி குறிப்பிட்ட மாதிரிகளில் தெளிவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது. மொழி குறிப்புகளின் வித்தியாசமான விளக்கங்களை  நம்முடைய ஆய்வுகள் தெரியும் பரிந்துரைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட முக்கியமான குணங்கள் பல கலாச்சாரத்திற்கு ஒத்திசைகளை பிடித்துக் கொள்கிறது மற்று மேலும் நாம் மொழிகளை மாற்ற மொழிகளை தேர்ந்தெடுக்கும் குறிப்பிட்ட உணர்வு ஆய்வுக்கு தேர்ந்தெடுக்கும் கீழ் தளத்தில் ம', 'sv': 'Mycket arbete inom translingual transfer learning undersökte hur man kan välja bättre överföringsspråk för flerspråkiga uppgifter, främst med fokus på typologiska och genealogiska likheter mellan språk. Vi antar att dessa mått på språklig närhet inte räcker när man arbetar med pragmatiskt motiverade uppgifter, såsom sentimentalanalys. Som ett alternativ introducerar vi tre språkliga drag som fångar tvärkulturella likheter som manifesterar sig i språkliga mönster och kvantifierar olika aspekter av språkpragmatik: språkkontextnivå, figurativt språk och lexifiering av känslobegrepp. Våra analyser visar att de föreslagna pragmatiska dragen fångar gränsöverskridande likheter och stämmer väl överens med befintligt arbete inom sociolingvistik och språkantropologi. Vi bekräftar vidare effektiviteten av pragmatiskt driven överföring i den efterföljande uppgiften att välja överföringsspråk för tvärspråkig sentimentalanalys.', 'ur': 'بہت سے کام کرسی زبان ترنسیٹر کی تعلیم کی تعلیم نے دیکھا کہ بہت سی زبان ترنسیٹر کی زبانیں کیسے اچھی ترنسیٹر کی زبانیں انتخاب کریں، سب سے پہلے زبانوں کے درمیان تایپولوژیکی اور ژنرالیک شباوت پر تمرکز ہم فرض کرتے ہیں کہ یہ اندازے زبان کی تقرب کی کافی نہیں ہیں جب ان کاموں کے ساتھ عمل کرتے ہیں جیسے احساس تحلیل. اور ہم تین زبان شناسی ویژگی کے طور پر معلوم کرتے ہیں جو زبان شناسی پٹرنوں میں ظاہر ہوتے ہیں اور زبان پراگرماتیک کی مختلف اندازے کی تعداد کرتی ہیں: زبان کنٹنسٹ سطح، انجیر کی زبان، اور احساسات عقیدوں کی لکھائی. ہمارے تحقیقات کو دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهادہ پراگرماتیک ویژے کثیر فرهنگی کی مثالیں پکڑ رہے ہیں اور اجتماعی زبان شناسی اور زبان شناسی انسان شناسی میں موجود عمل کے ساتھ اچھی طرح تسبیح کرتے ہیں۔ ہم اس سے زیادہ تعلیم دیتے ہیں کہ نہایت سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی زبانوں کو انتخاب کرنے کے', 'uz': "Ko'pchilik tillarda o'rganish o'rganishda ko'p ishni o'rgandi, ko'pchilik vazifalar uchun yaxshi tilni o'zgartirish uchun yaxshi tilni tanlash mumkin, asosida o'ylab turologik va genealog'iy tilning orasidagi bir xil tilga foydalanish mumkin. Biz o'ylaymiz, bu tilning eng yaxshi tili o'zgarishda ishlashda yetarli emas, huddi hisob-analyzer kabi vazifalar bilan ishlashda. Boshqa bo'lsa, biz uchta tillik xususiyatlarini ko'rib chiqaramiz, har xillik shakllarni ko'rsatadi va tillar pragmatiklarining boshqa qismlarini aniqlaydi: tillar context-level, fikrlik tillari, va hissiyotning g'oyalari fikrlarini ko'rsatadi. Analytiklarimizni ko'rsatadi, talab qilingan pragmatik xususiyatlarini bir xil cultural huddi qabul qiladi va sociolingutika va tillar anthropologida mavjud ishni bajaradi. Biz bir necha tillar o'zgarishni o'zgartirish uchun o'zgartirish vazifasini o'zgartiraymiz.", 'vi': 'Rất nhiều công việc trong việc học chuyển nhượng ngôn ngữ rộng tìm hiểu cách chọn ngôn ngữ chuyển đổi tốt hơn cho các công việc đa dạng, chủ yếu tập trung vào các điểm khác nhau ngôn ngữ. Chúng tôi cho rằng những biện pháp gần gũi ngôn ngữ này không đủ khi làm việc với các công việc thực dụng, như phân tích cảm xúc. Thay vào đó, chúng ta sẽ giới thiệu ba yếu tố ngôn ngữ, thu thập những điểm giống nhau về ngôn ngữ và đo định các khía cạnh khác nhau của thực dụng ngôn ngữ: ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ, ngôn ngữ bóng hình, và ngôn ngữ xúc cảm. Các phân tích của chúng tôi cho thấy các tính năng thực tế đề xuất thu thập các điểm văn hóa khác nhau và phù hợp với công trình xã hội và nhân loại ngôn ngữ. Chúng tôi xác nhận sự hiệu quả của việc chuyển nhượng theo phương pháp chuyên thuộc về việc chọn ngôn ngữ chuyển nhượng cho phân tích cảm xúc xuyên ngôn ngữ.', 'bg': 'Голяма работа в интерезичното трансферно обучение изследва как да се изберат по-добри трансферни езици за многоезични задачи, като основно се фокусира върху типологичните и генеалогичните прилики между езиците. Ние предполагаме, че тези мерки за лингвистична близост не са достатъчни при работа с прагматично мотивирани задачи, като например анализ на сантимента. Като алтернатива представяме три езикови черти, които улавят междукултурни прилики, които се проявяват в езиковите модели и количествено определят различни аспекти на езиковата прагматика: езиково ниво контекст, фигуративен език и лексификация на емоционалните понятия. Анализите ни показват, че предложените прагматични черти улавят междукултурни прилики и се съгласуват добре със съществуващата работа в социолингвистиката и лингвистичната антропология. Освен това потвърждаваме ефективността на прагматично ориентирания трансфер в задачата надолу по веригата избор на трансферни езици за междуезичен анализ на сентименталните чувства.', 'nl': 'Veel werk in cross-lingual transfer learning onderzocht hoe betere overdrachtstalen kunnen worden geselecteerd voor meertalige taken, met name gericht op typologische en genealogische overeenkomsten tussen talen. We veronderstellen dat deze maatstaven van taalkundige nabijheid onvoldoende zijn bij het werken met pragmatisch gemotiveerde taken, zoals sentimentanalyse. Als alternatief introduceren we drie linguïstische kenmerken die interculturele overeenkomsten vastleggen die zich manifesteren in taalpatronen en verschillende aspecten van taalpragmatica kwantificeren: taalcontextniveau, figuratieve taal en de lexificatie van emotieconcepten. Onze analyses tonen aan dat de voorgestelde pragmatische kenmerken interculturele overeenkomsten vastleggen en goed aansluiten bij bestaand werk in de sociolinguïstiek en linguïstische antropologie. We bevestigen verder de effectiviteit van pragmatisch gedreven overdracht in de downstream taak van het kiezen van transfertalen voor meertalige sentimentanalyse.', 'da': 'Meget arbejde inden for tværsproget overførselsindlæring undersøgte, hvordan man vælger bedre overførselssprog til flersprogede opgaver, primært med fokus på typologiske og slægtsforskelle ligheder mellem sprog. Vi antager, at disse målinger af sproglig nærhed ikke er nok, når man arbejder med pragmatisk motiverede opgaver, såsom sentimentalanalyse. Som et alternativ introducerer vi tre sproglige træk, der fanger tværkulturelle ligheder, der manifesterer sig i sproglige mønstre og kvantificerer forskellige aspekter af sprogpragmatikken: sprogkontekst-niveau, figurativt sprog og leksikering af følelsesbegreb. Vores analyser viser, at de foreslåede pragmatiske træk indfanger tværkulturelle ligheder og passer godt til eksisterende arbejde inden for sociolingvistik og sprogantropologi. Vi bekræfter yderligere effektiviteten af pragmatisk drevet overførsel i den efterfølgende opgave med at vælge overførselssprog til tværsproget sentimental analyse.', 'hr': 'Mnogi rad u učenju preko jezika prevođenja istražili su kako odabrati bolje prevođenje jezika za višejezičke zadatke, uglavnom fokusiranje na tipološke i genealogske sličnosti između jezika. Pretpostavljamo da ove mjere jezičke bliskosti nisu dovoljne kada rade s pragmatički motiviranim zadacima, poput analize osjećaja. Kao alternativa, predstavljamo tri jezičke karakteristike koje uključuju međukulturne sličnosti koje se pojavljuju u jezičkim obrascima i kvantificiraju različite aspekte jezičke pragmatike: jezički kontekstski nivo, figurativni jezik i leksifikacija emocionalnih koncepta. Naši analizi pokazuju da predložene pragmatske karakteristike uključuju međukulturne sličnosti i dobro se slažu s postojećim radom u sociolilingvističkoj i jezičkoj antropologiji. Dalje potvrđujemo učinkovitost pragmatički vođenog prenošenja u donjem zadatku biranja jezika prijenosa za analizu međujezičkih osjećaja.', 'de': 'Viel Arbeit im translingualen Transferlernen untersuchte, wie bessere Transfersprachen für mehrsprachige Aufgaben ausgewählt werden können, wobei der Schwerpunkt hauptsächlich auf typologischen und genealogischen Ähnlichkeiten zwischen Sprachen lag. Wir gehen davon aus, dass diese Maße der sprachlichen Nähe bei der Arbeit mit pragmatisch motivierten Aufgaben, wie z.B. der Stimmungsanalyse, nicht ausreichen. Als Alternative stellen wir drei linguistische Merkmale vor, die interkulturelle Ähnlichkeiten erfassen, die sich in linguistischen Mustern manifestieren und verschiedene Aspekte der Sprachpragmatik quantifizieren: Sprachkontextebene, Bildsprache und Lexifizierung von Emotionskonzepten. Unsere Analysen zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagenen pragmatischen Merkmale interkulturelle Ähnlichkeiten erfassen und gut mit bestehenden Arbeiten in der Soziolinguistik und linguistischen Anthropologie übereinstimmen. Weiterhin bestätigen wir die Effektivität des pragmatisch getriebenen Transfers in der nachgelagerten Aufgabe der Auswahl von Transfersprachen für die sprachübergreifende Stimmungsanalyse.', 'id': 'Banyak pekerjaan dalam pembelajaran transfer saling bahasa mempelajari bagaimana memilih bahasa transfer yang lebih baik untuk tugas multibahasa, terutama fokus pada perumpamaan tipologi dan genealogi antara bahasa. Kami hipotesis bahwa tindakan-tindakan dekat bahasa ini tidak cukup ketika bekerja dengan tugas yang bermotivasi pragmatis, seperti analisis perasaan. As an alternative, we introduce three linguistic features that capture cross-cultural similarities that manifest in linguistic patterns and quantify distinct aspects of language pragmatics: language context-level, figurative language, and the lexification of emotion concepts.  Analisis kami menunjukkan bahwa ciri-ciri pragmatis yang diusulkan menangkap persamaan budaya-budaya dan menyesuaikan dengan baik dengan pekerjaan yang ada dalam sosiolingvistik dan antropologi bahasa. Kami lebih lanjut mengkonfirmasi efektivitas dari transfer yang didorong secara pragmatis dalam tugas turun dari memilih bahasa transfer untuk analisis sentimen saling bahasa.', 'ko': '다중 언어 이동 학습의 많은 업무는 다중 언어 임무를 위해 어떻게 더 좋은 이동 언어를 선택하는지를 탐색했고 주로 언어 간의 유형과 계통의 유사성을 주목했다.우리는 언어용을 동기로 하는 임무(예를 들어 정서분석)를 처리할 때 이러한 언어의 접근도 측정이 부족하다고 가정한다.대체 방안으로 우리는 세 가지 언어 특징을 소개했다. 그들은 언어 모델에 나타난 다문화 유사성을 포착하고 언어 어용학의 서로 다른 측면인 언어 언어 환경 차원, 비유 언어와 감정 개념의 어휘화를 양적화했다.우리의 분석에 의하면 제시된 어용 특징은 다문화의 유사성을 확실히 포착했고 사회언어학과 언어인류학의 기존 연구와 잘 일치한다.우리는 언어 사용 구동의 이동이 이동 언어를 선택하여 다중 언어 감정 분석을 하는 하류 임무에서의 유효성을 한층 더 증명했다.', 'fa': 'کارهای زیادی در انتقال متوسط زبان کشف کردند که چگونه برای انتقال زبانهای بهتر برای کار های متوسط زبان انتقال دهند، که در اصل روی شبیه\u200cهای تایپولوژیکی و ژنتولوژیکی بین زبانها تمرکز می\u200cکنند. ما فرض می\u200cکنیم که این اندازه\u200cهای نزدیکترین زبان\u200cشناسی در زمان کار با وظیفه\u200cهای انگیزه\u200cگرایی، مثل تحلیل احساسات کافی نیستند. به عنوان یک جایگزینه، ما سه ویژگی زبان\u200cشناسی را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که شبیه\u200cهای متفاوت فرهنگی را می\u200cگیرند که در الگوهای زبان\u200cشناسی ظاهر می\u200cشوند و نقطه\u200cهای متفاوت از پراگرماتیک زبان\u200cشناسی می\u200cکنند: سطح محیط زبان، زبان\u200cشناسی و زبان تحلیل\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که ویژه\u200cهای پراگرماتیک پیشنهاد شبیه\u200cهای فرهنگی\u200cهای متفاوتی را می\u200cگیرند و با کار موجود در انسان\u200cشناسی\u200cهای اجتماعی و زبان\u200cشناسی خوب تطبیق می\u200cکنند. ما بیشتر تایید می\u200cکنیم که فعالیت انتقال\u200cکننده\u200cی تحلیل احساسات متوسط زبان\u200cها را در کار پایین انتخاب کنیم.', 'sw': 'Kazi nyingi katika kujifunza kwa lugha mbalimbali iligundua namna ya kuchagua lugha bora zaidi kwa ajili ya kazi za lugha mbalimbali, kwa ujumla wakijikita kwenye usawa wa kawaida na kizalendo kati ya lugha. Tunafikiri kuwa hatua hizi za ukaribisho wa lugha hazisaidi kufanya kazi na kazi zinazohamasishwa kwa kimapenzi, kama uchambuzi wa hisia. Kama mbadala, tunaonyesha vipengele vitatu vya lugha ambavyo vinavyofanana na utamaduni tofauti ambavyo vinaonekana katika mitindo ya lugha na kutoa vipengele tofauti vya maneno ya lugha: kiwango cha muktadha wa lugha, lugha ya takwimu, na dhana za hisia. Uchambuzi wetu unaonyesha kwamba vipengele vinavyopendekezwa vinavyofanana na utamaduni tofauti na kutengeneza vizuri kwa kazi zilizopo kwenye lugha za kijamii na lugha. Tunaweza kuunganisha ufanisi wa usafirishaji wa kimapenzi katika kazi ya chini ya mto wa kuchagua lugha za kuhamisha kwa uchambuzi wa hisia za lugha mbalimbali.', 'tr': 'Birnäçe diller arasynda köp diller terjime edip bilmek üçin köp işlemler, birnäçe diller üçin gowy terjime edilmelidir. Öňünde täpli we jeneral diller arasynda üns berilýär. Biz bu lingwistiki ýakynlaşyk ölçüleriniň pragmatiki höwes bilen işleýän zadlary, duýgular analizi ýaly, ýeterlik däldigini pikir edip bilýäris. Başga bir şekilde, biz diller pragmatikiň üýtgeşmelerini çykarýan üç lingwistiki özellikleri görkeýäris we diller pragmatikiň üýtgeşmelerini tassyklaýarys: diller kontekst derejesi, figurativ dili we duýgyş düşünjeleriniň tekizliklerini çykarýarlar. Biziň analyzlarymyz öngörülen pragmatik özellikleriň sosyal dil we lingwistiki antropologiýada örän-kültürel meňzeşliklerden çykyp barýandygyny görkeýär. Biz pragmatiki görkezilýän transferlerin etkinlik täsirini aňsatlyk dillerini çarp diller duýgulamak üçin saýlamak täsirini kömekleýäris.', 'sq': 'Shumë punë në mësimin e transferit ndërgjuhësor eksploroi si të zgjedhësh gjuhët më të mira të transferimit për detyra shumëgjuhëse, duke u përqëndruar kryesisht në ngjashmëritë tipologjike dhe gjenealogjike midis gjuhëve. Ne hipotezojmë se këto masa të afërsisë gjuhësore nuk janë të mjaftueshme kur punojnë me detyra pragmatike-motivuar, të tilla si analiza e ndjenjave. Si një alternativë, ne futim tre karakteristika gjuhësore që kapin ngjashmëritë ndërkulturore që manifestohen në modelet gjuhësore dhe kuantifikojnë aspekte të veçanta të pragmatikës gjuhësore: niveli konteksti gjuhësore, gjuha figurative dhe lexifikimi i koncepteve emocionale. Analizat tona tregojnë se karakteristikat pragmatike të propozuara kapin ngjashmëritë ndërkulturore dhe përshtaten mirë me punën ekzistuese në sociolingvistikën dhe antropologjinë gjuhësore. Ne e korroborojmë më tej efektshmërinë e transferit pragmatik në detyrën poshtë të zgjedhjes së gjuhëve të transferimit për analizën e ndjenjave ndërgjuhësore.', 'af': "Baie werk in kruistale oordrag ondersoek hoe om beter oordrag tale te kies vir meerdertale taak, voorskynlik fokus op tipologiese en genealogiese gelykenisse tussen tale. Ons hipotesis dat hierdie gemaakte van lingwisiese proximiteit nie genoeg is wanneer werk met pragmatisies-motiveerde opdragte, soos sentimentanalisie. As 'n alternatief, introduseer ons drie lingwisiese eienskappe wat kruiskulturele gelykenisse opneem wat in lingwisiese patrone verskyn word en quantifiseer verskillende aspekte van taal pragmatike: taal konteksvlak, figuratiewe taal en die leksifikasie van emosie konsepte. Ons analiserings wys dat die voorgestelde pragmatike eienskappe kruiskulturele gelykenisse opvang en goed aligneer met bestaande werk in sosiallingwisiese en lingwisiese antropologie. Ons verbeter die effektiviteit van pragmatisies-gedrywe oordrag in die onderstreem taak van uitvoer tale kies vir kruistale sentimentanalisie.", 'am': 'በተለየ ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ ላይ ብዙ ሥራ ምረጡ ቋንቋዎችን እንዴት ለመለወጥ የሚሻል ቋንቋዎች ለብዙ ቋንቋዎች ስራዎችን ለመምረጥ ይፈልጋል፡፡ ይህች የቋንቋዊ ቅርብ መሆኑን በመሥራት፣ እንደተማያዊ አስተያየት፣ በተመሳሳይ ስራዎችን ለመሥራት አይበቃንም ብለን እናስባለን፡፡ በተለየ ምሳሌ፣ የቋንቋ ምሳሌ፣ የቋንቋ አካባቢ ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ደረጃዎች፣ የቋንቋ ምዕራብ እና የስህተት እውቀት አካባቢዎችን እናስታውቃለን፡፡ Analyzerቻችን የተዘጋጀው የባሕላዊ ብሔራዊ ብጤቶች እንዲያሳየፉ እና ማኅበራዊ ቋንቋዊ እና ቋንቋዊ ድረ ገጽ ውስጥ ያሉትን ሥራ ለመቀላቀል የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡ የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች አስተያየት ለመምረጥ የግንኙነት ነጻ በማድረግ ላይ የሚነሳውን ሥራ እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': "Շատ աշխատանք լեզուների փոխանցման միջև ուսումնասիրության ոլորտում ուսումնասիրեց, թե ինչպես ավելի լավ փոխանցել լեզուները բազլեզուների առաջադրանքների համար, հիմնականում կենտրոնացնելով լեզուների միջև տիպոլոգիական և գենալոգիական նմանություններին: Մենք ենթադրում ենք, որ լեզվաբանական մոտիկության այս չափումները բավարար չեն, երբ աշխատում ենք պրագմատիկապես մոտիվացված խնդիրների հետ, ինչպիսիք են զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը: Որպես այլընտրանք, մենք ներկայացնում ենք երեք լեզվաբանական առանձնահատկություններ, որոնք ներկայացնում են լեզվաբանական կաղապարներում հայտնվում միջմշակութային նմանությունները և քանակում են լեզվաբանական պրագմատիկայի առանձնահատկությունները' լեզվաբանական կոնտեքստի մակարդակը, ֆիզիգատիվ լեզվաբան Մեր վերլուծությունները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված պրագմատիկ հատկությունները ներառում են միջմշակութային նմանությունները և լավ համապատասխանում են սոցիալեգծային և լեզվաբանական մարդաբանության ոլորտում գոյություն ունեցող աշխատանքի հետ: Մենք նաև հաստատում ենք պրագմատիկապես առաջնորդված փոխանցման արդյունավետությունը հետագա խնդրի մեջ՝ լեզուների փոխանցման ընտրությունը լեզվի միջև տարբեր զգացմունքների վերլուծության համար:", 'az': 'Çox dilli transfer öyrənməsində çox işlər çoxlu dillərin çoxlu dillər üçün daha yaxşı transfer dillərini seçməsini keşfetmişdilər, ilk dəfə dillərin arasındakı typolojik və geneolojik bənzərinə odaqlanır. Biz bu dillərin yaxınlığının ölçülərinin pragmatik olaraq motivasyon işləri ilə çalışdığında, hiss analizi kimi, yeterli deyildir. Alternatif olaraq, biz 3 dil müxtəlif fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli tərzlərini təşkil edirik ki, dil məlumatı, figurativ Bizim analizimiz təbliğ edilmiş pragmatik özelliklərin çoxlu kültürlük bənzərini alır və sosyal dil və dil antropolojisində mövcuddur işlərlə yaxşı düzəldirlər. Biz daha çox pragmatik tərəfindən sürüklənmiş tərəfdarlıqların çox dilli hiss analizi üçün tərəfdarlıq dillərini seçmək üçün istifadə edirik.', 'bn': 'ক্রিভাষাভাষী পরিবর্তন শিক্ষা শিক্ষায় অনেক কাজ খুঁজে বেছে নিয়েছে কিভাবে বহুভাষী কাজের জন্য ভাষাগুলো ভাষাকে বেছে নিতে পারে, প্রধান আমরা এই ধরনের ভাষাগত কাজের সাথে কাজ করার সময় যথেষ্ট নয়, যেমন আবেগ বিশ্লেষণ। একটি বিকল্প হিসেবে আমরা তিনটি ভাষার বিশেষ বিষয়গুলোকে পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি যা ক্রিস্কৃতিক সংস্কৃতির সমতুল্য গ্রহণ করে যা ভাষার ভাষায় প্রকাশ করে এবং ভাষার বিভিন্ন ভাষার প্রকৃ আমাদের বিশ্লেষণ দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত প্রযুক্তিগত বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর বৈশিষ্ট্য অনুযায়ী সাংস্কৃতিক সম ক্রিভাষাভাষী অনুভূতি বিশ্লেষণের জন্য আমরা নীচে নিচে যাওয়ার কাজে ভাষাগুলো বেছে নিয়ে যাওয়ার কার্যক্রম বেছে নিয়েছি।', 'bs': 'Mnogi rad u učenju preko jezika prevođenja istražili su kako odabrati bolje prevođenje jezika za višejezičke zadatke, uglavnom fokusiranje na tipološke i genealogske sličnosti između jezika. Pretpostavljamo da ove mjere jezičke bliskosti nisu dovoljne kada rade s pragmatički motiviranim zadacima, poput analize osjećaja. Kao alternativa, predstavljamo tri jezičke karakteristike koje uključuju međukulturne sličnosti koje se pojavljuju u jezičkim obrascima i kvantificiraju različite aspekte jezičke pragmatike: jezički kontekstski nivo, figurativni jezik i leksifikacija emocionalnih koncepta. Naši analizi pokazuju da predložene pragmatične karakteristike uhvate krstokulturne sličnosti i dobro se slažu sa postojećim radom u sociolilingvističkoj i lingvističkoj antropologiji. Dalje potvrđujemo učinkovitost pragmatički vođenog prenošenja u donjem zadatku biranja jezika prenošenja za analizu međujezika sentimenta.', 'ca': "Molta feina en l'aprenentatge translingüístic de transfer ència va explorar com seleccionar millor llengües de transferència per a tasques multilingües, centrant-se principalment en similituds tipològices i genealògices entre les llengües. Suposem que aquestes mesures de proximitat lingüística no són suficients quan treballem amb tasques motivades pragmàticament, com l'anàlisi del sentiment. Com a alternativa, introduïm tres característiques lingüístices que capturen similituds interculturals que es manifesten en patrons lingüístics i quantifiquen aspectes distints de les pràgmatiques lingüístices: nivell de contexte lingüístic, llenguatge figuratiu i la lexificació de conceptes emocionals. Els nostres anàlisis demostren que les característiques pragmàtiques proposades capturen similituds interculturals i s'alineixen bé amb la feina existent en la sociolingüística i l'antropologia lingüística. També corroborem l'eficacia de la transfer ència orientada pragmàticament en la tasca avall d'escollir llengües de transferència per a l'anàlisi del sentiment translingüístic.", 'et': 'Palju tööd keeleülese siirdeõppe valdkonnas uuriti, kuidas valida paremini siirdekeeli mitmekeelsete ülesannete jaoks, keskendudes eelkõige keelte tüpoloogilistele ja genealoogilistele sarnasustele. Hüpoteesime, et pragmaatiliselt motiveeritud ülesannetega töötamisel, näiteks sentimentaalüüsiga, ei piisa keelelise läheduse mõõtmetest. Alternatiivina tutvustame kolme keelelist joont, mis kajastavad kultuuridevahelisi sarnasusi, mis ilmnevad keelelistes mustrites ja kvantifitseerivad keele pragmaatika erinevaid aspekte: keelekonteksti tasandil, kujunduskeel ja emotsioonide mõistete leksifikatsioon. Meie analüüsid näitavad, et väljapakutud pragmaatilised jooned kajastavad kultuuridevahelisi sarnasusi ja sobivad hästi olemasoleva tööga sotsiolingvistikas ja lingvistilises antropoloogias. Lisaks kinnitame pragmaatiliselt juhitud siirde tõhusust järgnevas ülesandes valida siirdekeeled keeltevaheliseks sentimentaalüüsiks.', 'fi': 'Monikielisessä siirtooppimisessa tutkittiin paljon, miten monikielisiin tehtäviin voitaisiin valita paremmin siirtokieliä, keskittyen ensisijaisesti kielten typologisiin ja sukutieteellisiin yhtäläisyyksiin. Oletamme, että nämä kielellisen läheisyyden mittarit eivät riitä käytännöllisesti motivoituneiden tehtävien, kuten tunteiden analysoinnin, parissa. Vaihtoehtoisesti esittelemme kolme kielellistä piirrettä, jotka kuvaavat kielellisissä malleissa ilmeneviä kulttuurienvälisiä yhtäläisyyksiä ja kvantifioivat kielellisen pragmatiikan eri puolia: kielen kontekstitaso, figuratiivinen kieli ja tunnekäsitteiden leksikointi. Analyysimme osoittavat, että ehdotetut pragmaattiset piirteet vangitsevat kulttuurienvälisiä yhtäläisyyksiä ja sopivat hyvin yhteen sosiokingvistiikan ja lingvistisen antropologian olemassa olevaan työhön. Vahvistamme myös käytännönläheisen siirron tehokkuutta jatkovaiheen tehtävässä valita siirtokielet monikieliseen tunteiden analysointiin.', 'cs': 'Mnohá práce při výuce mezijazyčného transferu zkoumala, jak vybrat lepší přenosové jazyky pro vícejazyčné úkoly, se zaměřením především na typologické a genealogické podobnosti mezi jazyky. Předpokládáme hypotézu, že tato měřítka jazykové blízkosti nestačí při práci s pragmaticky motivovanými úkoly, jako je analýza sentimentů. Alternativně představujeme tři jazykové rysy, které zachycují mezikulturní podobnosti, které se projevují v jazykových vzorcích a kvantifikují odlišné aspekty jazykové pragmatiky: jazyková kontextová úroveň, obrazný jazyk a lexifikace emočních konceptů. Naše analýzy ukazují, že navržené pragmatické rysy zachycují mezikulturní podobnosti a dobře ladí se stávajícími pracemi v sociolingvistice a lingvistické antropologii. Dále potvrzujeme efektivitu pragmaticky řízeného transferu v následném úkolu výběru transferových jazyků pro analýzu nálad mezi jazyky.', 'ha': "Yin aiki mai yawa cikin shirin motsi na ɗabi'a-linguin aka gane jinsi za'a zãɓe lugha masu amfani da shiryarwa masu shirya wa aikin mulki-lingui, ana ƙayyade fokus a kan typogi da jerogi masu daidaita tsakanin harshen. Tuna gaskata cewa ba za'a isa ga aikin da aka yi wa aikin aiki da aka haramta da mazaɓa, kamar anarwa na hisani. Kama da wata musamman, za mu ƙara wasu fasihi uku cikin lingui waɗanda ke kãma misãlai guda-kultur waɗanda ke bayyana cikin cikin cikin linguin-harshen kuma ke ƙayyade masu buƙata masu cikin mazaɓa na harshe: harshe-daraja, da harshe-fasihi, da kuma kallo na zafi'urar zafi. AnalyyinMu na nũna cewa, misãlai da aka bukatar su na kãma misãlai masu cikin kulturci na dabar-kultur kuma sunã daidaita da aikin da ke cikin sosialisiki da linguistic. Ko ƙara, Munã sarrafa aikin wanda aka yi tafiyar da shi na ƙanshi da ke cikin aikin da ke iya ƙarami wa ka zãɓi lugha-daban dõmin a yi anadi na fassarar-na'ura.", 'jv': 'Open with Awak dhéwé éndah hal-hal nganggep kuwi akèh pengguna luwih-luwih kuwi ora sapa ngono nggawe pragmulalakno-ot, koyo ngono hal-salamat susahe. Ing Alternate, kita mêrke karo telu akeh sira-ingkang langgar sapa-suku kanggo nguasai gambaran karo hal-suku winih lan nggawe nguasai perusahaan karo perusahaan langgar: langgar kontèks-evel, akeh langgar lan nggawe nguasai perusahaan langgar. Awakdhéwé éntuk karo hal-hal nganggo pragmatik sing bisalakno karo hal-hal dumadhi sak nguasakno karo ngono nggawe barang kelangan karo sapa ngulinggusut karo ana ilemangkat lan akeh dumadhi. Awak dhéwé nglanggar aturan luwih bantuan nggawe praksi-stiftar nggawe barang langgar tarjamahan kanggo nggawe langgar bantuan seneng pisan.', 'sk': 'Veliko dela na področju medjezičnega prenosnega učenja je raziskovalo, kako izbrati boljše prenosne jezike za večjezične naloge, pri čemer se je osredotočilo predvsem na tipološke in genealoške podobnosti med jeziki. Predpostavljamo, da ta merila jezikovne bližine niso dovolj pri delu s pragmatično motiviranimi nalogami, kot je analiza sentimenta. Kot alternativa predstavimo tri jezikovne značilnosti, ki zajemajo medkulturne podobnosti, ki se kažejo v jezikovnih vzorcih in kvantificirajo različne vidike jezikovne pragmatike: jezikovna kontekstna raven, figurativni jezik in leksifikacija čustvenih konceptov. Naše analize kažejo, da predlagane pragmatične značilnosti zajemajo medkulturne podobnosti in se dobro ujemajo z obstoječim delom na področju sociolingvistike in jezikovne antropologije. Nadalje potrjujemo učinkovitost pragmatično usmerjenega prenosa pri nadaljnji nalogi izbire prenosnih jezikov za medjezično analizo sentimentalnih občutkov.', 'he': 'עבודה רבה בלימודי העברת שפות בין שפות חקרו כיצד לבחור שפות העברה טובות יותר עבור משימות רבות שפות, המרכז בעיקר על דומות טיפולוגיות וגנלאלוגיות בין שפות. אנו מניחים שהמדידות הללו של קרובות לשונית לא מספיקות כשעובדים עם משימות מוטיבציה פרגמטית, כמו ניתוח רגשות. בתור אלטרנטיבה, אנחנו מכירים שלושה תכונות שפתיים שמתפסות דומות בין תרבות שמופרסמות בדפוסים שפתיים ומגדלות היבטים הבודדים של פרגמטיקת שפת: רמת הקשר לשפת, שפה פיגורטיבית, ולקסיפקציה של מושג רגשות. הניתוחים שלנו מראים שהתכונות הפרגמטיות המוצעות כותבות דומות בין תרבות ומתאימות היטב לעבודה קיימת באנטרופולוגיה הסוציולינגוסטית והשפתית. אנו מאשרים יותר את היעילות של העברה המנועדת לפרגמטית במשימה התחתונה של לבחור שפות העברה לניתוח רגשות דרך שפתיים.', 'bo': 'སྐད འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བའི་གྲོས་ཚད་འདི་ཚུ་pragmatically-motivated tasks དང་། སེམས་ཚོར་ཞིབ་དང་། འདྲ་བ་དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོས་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཀྱི་དབར་ཆ་གསུམ་སྟོན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དག་གིས་སྔོན་འཆར་བྱས་པའི་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་མཐུན་རིམ་དང་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་སྐད་ཡིག་མིའི་ ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་མཐུན་སྣེ་ཚོར་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་གྱི་ལྟ་བ་གཞན་ལས་ཕར་རིམ་མཐུན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'PHASE : Learning Emotional Phase-aware Representations for Suicide Ideation Detection on Social Media', 'ar': 'المرحلة: تعلم التمثيلات العاطفية المدركة للمراحل لاكتشاف الأفكار الانتحارية على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي', 'pt': 'FASE: Aprendizagem de representações conscientes da fase emocional para detecção de ideação suicida nas mídias sociais', 'es': 'FASE: Aprendizaje de representaciones emocionales conscientes de la fase para la detección de ideas suicidas en las redes sociales', 'fr': 'PHASE\xa0: Apprentissage de représentations sensibles à la phase émotionnelle pour la détection des idées suicidaires sur les réseaux sociaux', 'hi': 'चरण: सामाजिक मीडिया पर आत्महत्या विचारधारा का पता लगाने के लिए भावनात्मक चरण-जागरूक अभ्यावेदन सीखना', 'ja': 'フェーズ：ソーシャルメディアでの自殺思想検出のための感情的フェーズ認識表現の学習', 'zh': '阶段:社交媒体学自度', 'ru': 'ЭТАП: Изучение эмоционально-фазовых представлений для обнаружения суицидальных идей в социальных сетях', 'ga': 'CÉIM: Ag Foghlaim Léirithe Mothúchánacha atá Feasach ar Chéim le haghaidh Braite Smaointe Féinmharaithe ar na Meáin Shóisialta', 'el': 'ΦΑΣΗ: Μάθηση Συναισθηματικών Εκπροσώπων Φάσης για την Ανίχνευση Ιδεών Αυτοκτονίας στα Κοινωνικά Μέσα', 'ka': 'PHASE: სოციალური მედიაში ემოციონალური ფეზის გასწავლება', 'hu': 'FÁzis: Az érzelmi fázistudatos képviseletek tanulása az öngyilkossági ötletek felismeréséhez a közösségi médián', 'kk': 'ФАСЕ: Көңіл мәліметтерді көңіл мәліметтерді білеу', 'ms': 'FASA: Mempelajari Perwakilan Tahap Emosi untuk Pengesanan Ideasi Bunuh diri pada Media Sosial', 'it': 'FASE: Apprendimento Emozionale Rappresentazioni consapevoli della fase per il rilevamento di idee suicidi sui social media', 'ml': 'പാസ്: സോഷ്യല്\u200d മെഡിയയില്\u200d ആത്മഹത്യ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയ', 'lt': 'FAZIJA: Mokymasis emociniu etapu suprantamu savižudybės idėjų aptikimu socialinėje žiniasklaidoje', 'mk': 'ФАЗА: Научи емоционални фази свесни претставувања за идеи за самоубиство во социјалните медиуми', 'mt': 'PHASE: Learning Emotional Phase-aware Representations for Suicide Ideation Detection on Social Media', 'no': 'PHASE: Læring av følsamningsverdi for å oppdaga sjølvideasjon på sosiale mediar', 'pl': 'FAZA: Uczenie się emocjonalnych fazowych reprezentacji dla wykrywania idei samobójczych w mediach społecznościowych', 'mn': 'МАНГАН: Нийгмийн мэдээллийн мэдээллийн сэтгэл хөдлөл ойлголтыг сурах', 'sr': 'Naučenje predstavljanja emocionalnih faza za otkrivanje ideje samoubistva na socijalnim medijima', 'ro': 'Faza: Învățarea reprezentărilor emoționale conștiente de fază pentru detectarea ideilor sinucigașe pe rețelele sociale', 'si': 'PHASE: සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයානයේ හොයාගන්න හිතාගන්න හිතාගන්න හිතාගන්න', 'sv': 'FAS: Lärande Emotionella Fasmedvetna representationer för självmordsidéer detektering på sociala medier', 'ur': 'فیس: سوسیل میڈیا کے ذریعہ جہاد کے لئے احساساتی فاز جانتے ہیں', 'so': 'PHASE: Learning Emotional Phase-aware Representations for Suicide Detection of Social Media', 'ta': 'பாச்: தான் கொலை கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான உணர்வு தெரியும் தீர்வுகளை கற்றுக்கொள்வது சமூக ஊடகங்கள்', 'uz': "PHASE: Suiciy aniqlash uchun Emotional Phase taʼminlovchilarini o'rganish", 'vi': 'Nghiên cứu Bước Bước Bước Bước Bước Bước Bước để phát hiện tự tử', 'bg': 'ФАЗА: Учене на емоционални Фаза-осъзнати представителства за откриване на представа за самоубийство в социалните медии', 'da': 'FASE: Læring Følelsesmæssige fasebevidste repræsentationer til detektering af selvmordsidéer på sociale medier', 'hr': 'FAZE: Naučenje predstavljanja emocionalnih faza za otkrivanje ideje samoubojstva na socijalnim medijima', 'nl': 'Fase: Emotionale Fase-bewuste Representaties leren voor Zelfmoord Ideatie Detectie op Social Media', 'id': 'PHASE: Belajar Perwakilan Tahap Emosi untuk Ide Bunuh diri Deteksi Media Sosial', 'de': 'PHASE: Emotionale phasenbewusste Repräsentationen für Suizid Ideation Detection in Social Media lernen', 'ko': '단계: 소셜 미디어에서 자살 의향 측정의 정서 단계 감지 표징을 학습한다', 'fa': 'فیس: یاد گرفتن نمایش\u200cهای مراحل احساساتی برای کشف ایده\u200cهای خودکشی در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی', 'sw': 'PHASE: Kufundisha maoni yanayofahamika kwa hatua ya uzito kwa ajili ya Kutambua Uchunguzi wa Kujiua kwa Vyombo vya Habari vya kijamii', 'tr': 'Hasat:Sosyal medyeleri tarafından duygusal bir aşama bilinçli temsiller öğrenmek', 'sq': 'Faza: Mësimi i përfaqësimeve të ndërgjegjshme në fazën emocionale për zbulimin e ideve vetëvrasëse në mediat sociale', 'af': 'Faks: Leer van Emotionale fase-bewyse voorstellings vir Suicide Ideasie-Opdekking op Sosiale Media', 'am': 'PHASE: ማኅበራዊ ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ላይ ለራሳቸው አፍቃድ መግለጫ ማስተማር', 'hy': 'ՖԱՍԱ. Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների ուսումնասիրելը', 'az': 'PHASE: 칐yr톛nm톛k 칲칞칲n 칐z칲n칲n 칐z칲n칲n 칐z칲n칲n 칐z칲n칲n 칐z칲n칲n 칐z칲n칲n 칐z칲n칲n 칐z칲n칲n 칐z칲n칲n 칐z칲n칲n 칐z칲n칲n 칐z칲n칲n 칐z칲n칲n 칐z칲n칲n', 'bn': 'PHASE: Learning Emotional Phase-aware Representations for Suicide Ideation Detection on Social Media', 'bs': 'Naučenje predstavljanja emocionalnih faza za otkrivanje ideje samoubojstva na socijalnim medijima', 'cs': 'FÁZE: Učení se emocionálních fázových reprezentací pro detekci myšlenek o sebevraždě na sociálních médiích', 'et': 'FAAS: Emotsionaalsete faasiteadlike esinduste õppimine enesetapuideede tuvastamiseks sotsiaalmeedias', 'fi': 'VAIHE: Itsemurha-ideoiden havaitsemiseen tähtäävien tunnetietoisten edustustojen oppiminen sosiaalisessa mediassa', 'ca': 'FASE: Aprendre representacions emocionals conscients de la fase per detectar idees de suïcidi als mitjans socials', 'he': 'PHASE: Learning Emotional Phase-aware Representations for Suicide Ideation Detection on Social Media', 'sk': 'FAZA: Učenje čustvenih predstavništev faznega zavedanja za odkrivanje samomorilskih idej na socialnih medijih', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'jv': 'deep', 'bo': 'PHASE: སྤྱི་ཚོགས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་གྱི་རང་ཉིད་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་བའི་ཕྱོགས་རིམ་སྟོན་པ་དང་།'}
{'en': 'Recent psychological studies indicate that individuals exhibiting suicidal ideation increasingly turn to social media rather than mental health practitioners. Contextualizing the build-up of such ideation is critical for the identification of users at risk. In this work, we focus on identifying suicidal intent in tweets by augmenting linguistic models with emotional phases modeled from users’ historical context. We propose PHASE, a time-and phase-aware framework that adaptively learns features from a user’s historical emotional spectrum on Twitter for preliminary screening of suicidal risk. Building on clinical studies, PHASE learns phase-like progressions in users’ historical Plutchik-wheel-based emotions to contextualize suicidal intent. While outperforming state-of-the-art methods, we show the utility of temporal and phase-based emotional contextual cues for suicide ideation detection. We further discuss practical and ethical considerations.', 'ar': 'تشير الدراسات النفسية الحديثة إلى أن الأفراد الذين يظهرون أفكارًا انتحارية يتجهون بشكل متزايد إلى وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي بدلاً من ممارسي الصحة العقلية. إن تحديد سياق بناء مثل هذه الأفكار أمر بالغ الأهمية لتحديد المستخدمين المعرضين للخطر. في هذا العمل ، نركز على تحديد النية الانتحارية في التغريدات من خلال زيادة النماذج اللغوية بمراحل عاطفية على غرار السياق التاريخي للمستخدمين. نقترح PHASE ، إطار عمل يدرك الوقت والمراحل يتعلم بشكل تكيفي الميزات من الطيف العاطفي التاريخي للمستخدم على Twitter للفحص الأولي لخطر الانتحار. بناءً على الدراسات السريرية ، تتعلم PHASE التقدم الذي يشبه المرحلة في المشاعر التاريخية القائمة على Plutchik للمستخدمين لوضع النية الانتحارية في سياقها. أثناء تفوقنا على أحدث الأساليب ، نعرض فائدة الإشارات السياقية العاطفية الزمانية والقائمة على المرحلة لاكتشاف الأفكار الانتحارية. نناقش كذلك الاعتبارات العملية والأخلاقية.', 'fr': "Des études psychologiques récentes indiquent que les personnes présentant des idées suicidaires se tournent de plus en plus vers les médias sociaux plutôt que vers les professionnels de la santé mentale. La contextualisation de l'accumulation d'une telle idéation est essentielle pour identifier les utilisateurs à risque. Dans ce travail, nous nous concentrons sur l'identification de l'intention suicidaire dans les tweets en complétant les modèles linguistiques avec des phases émotionnelles modélisées à partir du contexte historique des utilisateurs. Nous proposons PHASE, un cadre sensible au temps et à la phase qui apprend de manière adaptative des fonctionnalités du spectre émotionnel historique d'un utilisateur sur Twitter pour un dépistage préliminaire du risque suicidaire. En s'appuyant sur des études cliniques, PHASE apprend les progressions de type phase dans les émotions historiques basées sur la roue de Plutchik des utilisateurs afin de contextualiser l'intention suicidaire. Tout en surpassant les méthodes de pointe, nous démontrons l'utilité des indices contextuels émotionnels temporels et basés sur les phases pour la détection des idées suicidaires. Nous discutons également de considérations pratiques et éthiques.", 'es': 'Estudios psicológicos recientes indican que las personas que exhiben ideas suicidas recurren cada vez más a las redes sociales en lugar de a los profesionales de la salud mental. Contextualizar la creación de tal ideación es fundamental para la identificación de los usuarios en riesgo. En este trabajo, nos centramos en identificar la intención suicida en los tuits mediante el aumento de los modelos lingüísticos con fases emocionales modeladas a partir del contexto histórico de los usuarios. Proponemos PHASE, un marco sensible al tiempo y la fase que aprende de forma adaptativa las características del espectro emocional histórico de un usuario en Twitter para la detección preliminar del riesgo suicida. Sobre la base de estudios clínicos, PHASE aprende progresiones en fase en las emociones históricas basadas en la rueda Plutchik de los usuarios para contextualizar la intención suicida. Si bien superamos los métodos más avanzados, mostramos la utilidad de las señales contextuales emocionales temporales y basadas en fases para la detección de ideas suicidas. Discutimos más a fondo las consideraciones prácticas y éticas.', 'pt': 'Estudos psicológicos recentes indicam que indivíduos que apresentam ideação suicida recorrem cada vez mais às mídias sociais em vez de profissionais de saúde mental. Contextualizar a construção de tal ideação é fundamental para a identificação de usuários em risco. Neste trabalho, nos concentramos em identificar a intenção suicida em tweets, aumentando modelos linguísticos com fases emocionais modeladas a partir do contexto histórico dos usuários. Propomos o PHASE, uma estrutura com reconhecimento de tempo e fase que aprende de forma adaptativa características do espectro emocional histórico de um usuário no Twitter para triagem preliminar de risco de suicídio. Com base em estudos clínicos, o PHASE aprende progressões semelhantes a fases nas emoções históricas baseadas na roda de Plutchik dos usuários para contextualizar a intenção suicida. Embora superando os métodos de última geração, mostramos a utilidade de pistas contextuais emocionais temporais e baseadas em fases para a detecção de ideação suicida. Discutimos ainda considerações práticas e éticas.', 'ja': '最近の心理学的研究によると、自殺念慮を示す個人は、メンタルヘルスの実践者ではなく、ソーシャルメディアに向かうことが増えている。このようなアイデアの構築をコンテキスト化することは、危険にさらされているユーザーを特定するために重要です。この研究では、ユーザーの歴史的文脈からモデル化された感情的フェーズで言語モデルを拡張することによって、ツイートにおける自殺の意図を特定することに焦点を当てています。私たちは、自殺リスクの予備審査のために、Twitter上のユーザーの過去の感情スペクトルから特徴を適応的に学習する、時間とフェーズを認識するフレームワークであるフェーズを提案します。臨床研究に基づいて、フェーズは、自殺の意図を文脈化するために、ユーザーの過去のPlutchik - Wheelベースの感情のフェーズのような進行を学習します。最先端の方法を凌駕する一方で、自殺念慮検出のための時間的および位相ベースの感情的文脈的手がかりの有用性を示しています。私たちは、実践的かつ倫理的な考慮事項についてさらに議論します。', 'hi': 'हाल के मनोवैज्ञानिक अध्ययनों से संकेत मिलता है कि आत्मघाती विचारधारा का प्रदर्शन करने वाले व्यक्ति मानसिक स्वास्थ्य चिकित्सकों के बजाय सोशल मीडिया की ओर तेजी से मुड़ते हैं। इस तरह के विचारों के निर्माण को संदर्भित करना जोखिम वाले उपयोगकर्ताओं की पहचान के लिए महत्वपूर्ण है। इस काम में, हम उपयोगकर्ताओं के ऐतिहासिक संदर्भ से मॉडलिंग किए गए भावनात्मक चरणों के साथ भाषाई मॉडल को बढ़ाकर ट्वीट्स में आत्मघाती इरादे की पहचान करने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। हम चरण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, एक समय-और चरण-जागरूक रूपरेखा जो आत्मघाती जोखिम की प्रारंभिक स्क्रीनिंग के लिए ट्विटर पर उपयोगकर्ता के ऐतिहासिक भावनात्मक स्पेक्ट्रम से विशेषताओं को अनुकूलित रूप से सीखती है। नैदानिक अध्ययनों पर निर्माण, चरण आत्मघाती इरादे को संदर्भित करने के लिए उपयोगकर्ताओं के ऐतिहासिक प्लूचिक-व्हील-आधारित भावनाओं में चरण जैसी प्रगति सीखता है। अत्याधुनिक तरीकों से आगे निकलते समय, हम आत्महत्या विचारधारा का पता लगाने के लिए अस्थायी और चरण-आधारित भावनात्मक प्रासंगिक संकेतों की उपयोगिता दिखाते हैं। हम आगे व्यावहारिक और नैतिक विचारों पर चर्चा करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Недавние психологические исследования показывают, что люди, проявляющие суицидальное мышление, все чаще обращаются к социальным сетям, а не к специалистам по психическому здоровью. Контекстуализация формирования такого мышления имеет решающее значение для выявления пользователей, подверженных риску. В этой работе мы фокусируемся на выявлении суицидальных намерений в твитах путем дополнения лингвистических моделей эмоциональными фазами, смоделированными из исторического контекста пользователей. Мы предлагаем ФАЗУ, временную и фазовую структуру, которая адаптивно изучает функции из исторического эмоционального спектра пользователя в Twitter для предварительного скрининга суицидального риска. Основываясь на клинических исследованиях, ФАЗА изучает фазоподобные прогрессии в исторических эмоциях пользователей на основе колеса Плутчика, чтобы контекстуализировать суицидальные намерения. Превзойдя современные методы, мы показываем полезность временных и фазовых эмоциональных контекстуальных сигналов для обнаружения мыслей о самоубийстве. Далее мы обсуждаем практические и этические соображения.', 'zh': '近心理学研明,见意者转多社交媒体而非心理健康从业者。 夫积情于知危之用户至重也。 注意于强言以识推文之意,有建模用户之历史背景。 吾等建PHASE,此一时感知框架,可自适于Twitter上用户史情谱中学特征,以初步筛选自杀风险。 临床之基,PHASE学用户史之Plutchik轮阶段性,以自杀于语境。 虽优于最先进之法,而展日月之情,以检测之实用性。 更论实德之虑。', 'ga': 'Léiríonn staidéir shíceolaíocha le déanaí go n-iompaíonn daoine aonair a thaispeánann smaoineamh féinmharaithe níos mó do na meáin shóisialta seachas do chleachtóirí meabhairshláinte. Tá sé ríthábhachtach cur le chéile smaointe den sórt sin a chomhthéacsú chun úsáideoirí atá i mbaol a aithint. Sa obair seo, dírímid ar rún féinmharaithe a aithint i dtvuíteanna trí mhúnlaí teangeolaíochta a mhéadú le céimeanna mothúchánacha arna múnlú ó chomhthéacs stairiúil na n-úsáideoirí. Molaimid PHASE, creat atá feasach ar am agus ar chéimeanna a fhoghlaimíonn go hoiriúnaitheach gnéithe ó speictream mothúchánach stairiúil úsáideora ar Twitter chun réamhscagadh a dhéanamh ar riosca féinmharaithe. Ag tógáil ar staidéir chliniciúla, foghlaimíonn PHASE dul chun cinn cosúil le céim i mothúcháin atá bunaithe ar rotha Plutchik stairiúil úsáideoirí chun rún féinmharaithe a chur i gcomhthéacs. Cé go bhfuil ag éirí níos fearr leis na modhanna úrscothacha, léirímid úsáideacht leideanna comhthéacsúla mothúchánacha ama agus céim-bhunaithe chun smaoineamh féinmharaithe a bhrath. Déanaimid plé breise ar chúrsaí praiticiúla agus eiticiúla.', 'ka': 'შემდეგ ფსიკოლოგიური კვლევები აჩვენებენ, რომ ადამიანები საკუთარი იდეაციას, რომლებიც სოციალური მედიაციისთვის უფრო მეტი გადაბრუნდება, მაგრამ მესი ასეთი იდეაციის შექმნა კონტექსტულაცია კრიტიკურია გამოყენებელი რისკური იდენტიფიკაციისთვის. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ თავისუფალური მისამართების განსაზღვრებისათვის გავაკეთებთ ენგუფისტიკური მოდელების აზრუმენტირებით ემოციოლური ფაზებით, რომლებიც მომხმარებელ ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ PHASE, დროის და ფაზის მოცნობილი ფრამეტრი, რომელიც აეპტიგურად ისწავლის მომხმარებლის ისტორიული ემოციალური სპექტრემიდან Twitter-ში თავისუფლიო რისკის პრელიმენტური შე PHASE-ს კლინიკური კვლევების შესახებ მომხმარებლის ისტორიული პლექტიკური გრაფიკური ემოციების განმავლობაში მომხმარებელი პროგრესის განმავლობაში შესწავლა, რომ მომხმარებელი საზო მაშინ ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ სახელსაწყისი მეტოვები, ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენებთ ტემპალური და ტაზის ფეზის ემოციონალური კონტექსტური სიმბოლო ჩვენ უფრო კითხვა პრაქტიკური და ეტიკური აღმოჩენება.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατες ψυχολογικές μελέτες δείχνουν ότι άτομα που παρουσιάζουν αυτοκτονική σκέψη στρέφονται όλο και περισσότερο στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης παρά στους επαγγελματίες ψυχικής υγείας. Η πλαισίωση της δημιουργίας τέτοιων ιδεών είναι κρίσιμη για τον εντοπισμό των χρηστών που κινδυνεύουν. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εστιάζουμε στον εντοπισμό αυτοκτονικών προθέσεων στα tweets, ενισχύοντας γλωσσικά μοντέλα με συναισθηματικές φάσεις μοντελοποιημένες από το ιστορικό πλαίσιο των χρηστών. Προτείνουμε ένα πλαίσιο συνειδητής χρονικής και φάσης που μαθαίνει προσαρμοστικά χαρακτηριστικά από το ιστορικό συναισθηματικό φάσμα ενός χρήστη στο Twitter για τον προκαταρκτικό έλεγχο του κινδύνου αυτοκτονίας. Βασιζόμενος σε κλινικές μελέτες, μαθαίνει φάσεις των ιστορικών συναισθημάτων των χρηστών που βασίζονται στον τροχό Plutchik για να ενσωματώσει τις τάσεις αυτοκτονίας. Ενώ ξεπερνούμε τις σύγχρονες μεθόδους, δείχνουμε τη χρησιμότητα των χρονικών και φάσεων συναισθηματικών εννοιών για την ανίχνευση ιδεών αυτοκτονίας. Συζητούμε περαιτέρω πρακτικά και δεοντολογικά ζητήματα.', 'hu': 'A legutóbbi pszichológiai tanulmányok azt mutatják, hogy az öngyilkos gondolatokat mutató egyének egyre inkább a közösségi médiához fordulnak, mint a mentális egészségügyi szakemberekhez. Az ilyen gondolatok felépítésének kontextualizálása kulcsfontosságú a veszélyeztetett felhasználók azonosításához. Ebben a munkában az öngyilkossági szándék felismerésére összpontosítunk tweetekben, a felhasználók történelmi kontextusából modellezett érzelmi fázisokkal bővítve nyelvi modelleket. Javasoljuk a PHASE-t, egy idő- és fázistudatos keretrendszert, amely adaptívan tanulja meg a felhasználó történelmi érzelmi spektrumából a Twitteren az öngyilkossági kockázat előzetes szűréséhez. Klinikai vizsgálatokra építve a PHASE megtanulja a felhasználók történelmi Plutchik-kerék alapú érzelmeinek fázisszerű progresszióit, hogy kontextualizálja az öngyilkossági szándékot. Miközben a legkorszerűbb módszereket felülmúljuk, megmutatjuk, milyen hasznosak az időbeli és fázisalapú érzelmi kontextuális utak az öngyilkossági gondolatok felismeréséhez. Továbbá gyakorlati és etikai megfontolásokat vitatunk meg.', 'it': "Recenti studi psicologici indicano che le persone che mostrano idee suicidi si rivolgono sempre più ai social media piuttosto che ai professionisti della salute mentale. Contestualizzare l'accumulo di tale ideazione è fondamentale per l'identificazione degli utenti a rischio. In questo lavoro, ci concentriamo sull'identificazione di intenti suicidi nei tweet aumentando modelli linguistici con fasi emotive modellate dal contesto storico degli utenti. Proponiamo PHASE, un framework consapevole del tempo e della fase che apprende in modo adattivo le caratteristiche dello spettro emotivo storico di un utente su Twitter per lo screening preliminare del rischio suicida. Basandosi su studi clinici, PHASE apprende progressioni di fase nelle emozioni storiche basate sulla ruota Plutchik degli utenti per contestualizzare l'intento suicida. Mentre superiamo i metodi più moderni, mostriamo l'utilità di spunti contestuali emotivi temporali e di fase per la rilevazione di idee suicidi. Discuteremo ulteriormente considerazioni pratiche ed etiche.", 'kk': 'Жуырдағы психологикалық зерттеулері өзінің сезіншілік идеяциясын көрсеткен адамдар психикалық саулық тәжірибелерінің орнына, әлемдік медиақшаларға аудар Бұл идеяцияны құру контекстуализациясы қорқынышты пайдаланушылардың идентификациясы үшін маңызды. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, пайдаланушылардың тарихлық контекстінен модельген емоциялық қадамдары арқылы тілдік үлгілерді көбейту үшін өзіміздің өзіміздің өзіміздің өзім Біз PHASE дегенді таңдаймыз, уақыт және қадамдастыру бағдарламасын, оның Твиттердегі пайдаланушының тарихлық эмоциялық спектрумінің өзінің алдындағы қауіпсіздігін тексеру үшін оқу үшін. Клиникалық зерттеулерде PHASE пайдаланушылардың историялық Плутчик-желік негіздеген емоцияларының өзіңіздік мақсаттарын тексеру үшін қарапайым күйіне ұқсас береді. Жұмыс әдістерін өзімізге жеткізу үшін уақытша және этап негізделген емоциялық мәселелерді көрсету мүмкіндігін көрсетеді. Біз практикалық және этикалық қатынауларды қолданып тұрмыз.', 'mk': 'Неодамнешните психолошки студии покажуваат дека поединците кои изложуваат самоубиствени идеи сé повеќе се свртуваат кон социјалните медиуми наместо кон менталните здравствени практики. Контекстуалноста на изградбата на ваквите идеи е критична за идентификација на корисниците во опасност. Во оваа работа, се фокусираме на идентификацијата на самоубиствената намера на твитови со зголемување на јазичните модели со емоционални фази моделирани од историскиот контекст на корисниците. Предложуваме ФАСЕ, рамка на свесност за времето и фазата која адаптивно научи карактеристики од историскиот емоционален спектар на корисникот на Твитер за прелиминарно прегледување на самоубиствениот ризик. На основа на клиничките студии, ФАСЕ научи фазични прогресии во историските емоции на корисниците базирани на Plutchik-тркало за контекстуализација на самоубиствена намера. Додека ги надминуваме најдобрите методи, ја покажуваме корисноста на временски и фазички емоционални контекстуални знаци за детекција на идеи за самоубиство. Понатаму разговараме за практични и етички размислувања.', 'ml': 'അടുത്തുതന്നെ സൈക്കോളജിക്കല്\u200d പഠനം വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നു ആത്മഹത്യ ആശയങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്ന വ്യക്തികള്\u200d മാനസിക ആരോഗ്യാധികാരി അപകടത്തില്\u200d ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനായി ഇങ്ങനെയുള്ള ആശയങ്ങളുടെ പണിയുണ്ടാക്കുന്നത് പ്രധ ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ആത്മഹത്യയുടെ ലക്ഷ്യത്തെ തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. ട്ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ ചരിത്ര കോ നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രായസ് ചെയ്യുന്നു, ഒരു സമയവും പരിഗണിക്കുന്ന ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് പ്രായസ് ചെയ്യുന്നു. അത് പ്രാപ്തികമായി ഒരു ഉപയോക്താവിന്\u200dറെ ചരിത്രത്തിലെ വിക ക്ലിനിക്കല്\u200d പഠനങ്ങളില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d പാഹേസ് ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ ചരിത്രത്തിലെ പ്ലാച്ചിക്ക്-ചരിത്രത്തിലുള്ള വികാരങ്ങളി ആത്മഹത്യ ആശയം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സമയത്തിലും ഫേസില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായിട്ടുള്ള വികാരങ്ങളുടെ ഉപയോഗം കാണിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രാകൃതിക വിചാരകങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ചും സംസാരിക്കുന്നു.', 'lt': 'Neseniai atlikti psichologiniai tyrimai rodo, kad asmenys, turintys mintis apie savižudybę, vis dažniau kreipiasi į socialinę žiniasklaidą, o ne į psichikos sveikatos specialistus. Contextualizing the build-up of such ideation is critical for the identification of users at risk.  Šiame darbe daugiausia dėmesio skiriame savižudybės ketinimų nustatymui tweetuose didinant kalbinius modelius su emociniais etapais, modeliuojamais iš naudotojų istorinių kontekstų. Mes siūlome PHASE, laiko ir fazės suprantamą sistemą, kuri prisitaikytinai mokosi savybių iš naudotojo istorinio emocinio spektro Twitter, kad būtų galima išankstinio savižudybės rizikos patikrinimo. Remdamasi klinikiniais tyrimais, PHASE mokosi laipsniškai progresuoti naudotojų istorines Plutchik ratu grindžiamas emocijas, kad būtų atsižvelgta į savižudybės ketinimus. While outperforming state-of-the-art methods, we show the utility of temporal and phase-based emotional contextual cues for suicide ideation detection.  Toliau aptariame praktinius ir etinius aspektus.', 'mn': 'Саяхан сэтгэл зүйн судалгаанууд сэтгэл санааны эрүүл мэндийн мэргэжилтнүүдийн оронд өөрсдийгөө өөрийгөө өөрийгөө өөрийгөө өөрийгөө өөрийгөө өөрийгөө өөрийгөө авч үз Ийм санаануудыг бүтээх нь эрсдэлтэй хэрэглэгчдийг тодорхойлох нь чухал. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид өөрийгөө хорлох зорилго тайлбарлах дээр анхаарлаа анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлсэн хэрэглэгчийн түүхийн тухай сэтгэл хөдлөлийн загваруудыг нэмэгдүүлж буй хэлний загваруудыг тодорх Бид PHASE-г хугацаа болон дагавар ойлгох үйл ажиллагааны хэлбэрээр Twitter-д хэрэглэгчийн түүхийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн спектрийн тухай өөрийгөө аль хэдийн өөрийгөө аль хэмжээний эрсдэлийн шалгалтын тулд суралцаж Сэтгэл судалгааны тулд PHASE хэрэглэгчийн түүхийн Plutchik-wheel суурилсан сэтгэл хөдлөлийг өөрийгөө өөрийгөө өөрийгөө өөрчлөх зорилгоор ойлгохын тулд шиг дасгал хөгжлийг сурдаг. Өөрийгөө өөрийгөө өөрийгөө өөрийгөө алдах санааны тухай сэтгэл хөдлөлийн тухай хэрэгжүүлэх арга замыг харуулж байгаа юм. Бид дахиад практикийн, этикийн ойлголтын тухай ярилцдаг.', 'no': 'Nyleg psihologiske studier tyder på at indikatorene som viser sjølvslagsideasjon, større går til sosiale medier i staden for psykiske helsepraktiserar. Kontekstualisering av bygging av slike ideasjon er kritisk for identifiseringa av brukarar i risiko. I denne arbeida fokuserer vi på å identifisera selvårspålspålspålspålspålspålspålspålspålspålspålspålspålspålspålspålspålspålspålspålspålspålspålspålsp Vi foreslår PHASE, eit tid- og fas- oppmerksområde som tilpassar funksjonar frå ein brukaren historisk emosjonell spektrum på Twitter for første skjerm av selvcidal risiko. Byggende på kliniske studier, lærer PHASE fase-liknande framgangar i brukarane historiske plutchik-hjulbaserte emosjonar for å kontekstualisera selvstyrke. Mens du utfører kunstmetodane, viser vi verktøyet for tidlegare og fasebaserte emosjonelle kontekster for oppdaging av ideasjonar for selvårsomslag. Vi diskuterer meir praktiske og etiske forståking.', 'mt': "Recent psychological studies indicate that individuals exhibiting suicidal ideation increasingly turn to social media rather than mental health practitioners.  Il-kuntestwalizzazzjoni tal-bini ta’ tali ideat hija kritika għall-identifikazzjoni ta’ utenti f’riskju. F’dan ix-xogħol, niffokaw fuq l-identifikazzjoni tal-intenzjoni suwiċidali fit-tweets billi jżidu l-mudelli lingwistiċi b’fażijiet emozzjonali mmudellati mill-kuntest storiku tal-utenti. We propose PHASE, a time-and phase-aware framework that adaptively learns features from a user's historical emotional spectrum on Twitter for preliminary screening of suicidal risk.  Filwaqt li jibni fuq studji kliniċi, PHASE jitgħallem progressjonijiet simili għal fażijiet fl-emozzjonijiet storiċi bbażati fuq ir-roti Plutchik tal-utenti biex jikkuntestwalizzaw l-intenzjoni suwiċidali. While outperforming state-of-the-art methods, we show the utility of temporal and phase-based emotional contextual cues for suicide ideation detection.  We further discuss practical and ethical considerations.", 'ms': "Studi psikologi baru-baru ini menunjukkan bahawa individu yang menunjukkan fikiran bunuh diri semakin berubah kepada media sosial daripada doktor kesehatan mental. Memkontekstualisasi pembangunan idea tersebut adalah kritikal untuk pengenalpasti pengguna yang dalam bahaya. In this work, we focus on identifying suicidal intent in tweets by augmenting linguistic models with emotional phases modeled from users' historical context.  We propose PHASE, a time-and phase-aware framework that adaptively learns features from a user's historical emotional spectrum on Twitter for preliminary screening of suicidal risk.  Berdasarkan kajian klinik, PHASE belajar kemajuan seperti fasa dalam emosi sejarah pengguna berdasarkan roda Plutchik untuk mengkontekstualisasi niat bunuh diri. Sementara melampaui kaedah-kaedah-state-of-the-art, kita menunjukkan utiliti dari sementara dan fasa-berdasarkan isyarat kontekstual emosional untuk pengesan pemikiran bunuh diri. Kami lebih lanjut membincangkan pertimbangan praktik dan etik.", 'pl': 'Ostatnie badania psychologiczne wskazują, że osoby wykazujące myśli samobójcze coraz częściej zwracają się do mediów społecznościowych, a nie do praktyków zdrowia psychicznego. Kontekstualizacja budowy takich idei ma kluczowe znaczenie dla identyfikacji użytkowników zagrożonych. W niniejszej pracy skupiamy się na identyfikacji intencji samobójczych w tweetach poprzez rozszerzenie modeli językowych o fazy emocjonalne modelowane z kontekstu historycznego użytkowników. Proponujemy PHASE, framework świadomy czasu i fazy, który adaptacyjnie uczy się cech z historycznego spektrum emocjonalnego użytkownika na Twitterze w celu wstępnego przesiewu ryzyka samobójczego. Opierając się na badaniach klinicznych, PHASE uczy się fazowych postępów w historycznych emocjach użytkowników opartych na kołach Plutchika, aby kontekstualizować intencje samobójcze. Przewyższając najnowocześniejsze metody, pokazujemy użyteczność czasowych i fazowych emocjonalnych wskazówek kontekstowych do wykrywania idei samobójczych. Ponadto omawiamy kwestie praktyczne i etyczne.', 'ro': 'Studiile psihologice recente indică faptul că persoanele care prezintă idei sinucigașe apelează din ce în ce mai mult la social media decât la practicienii de sănătate mintală. Contextualizarea acumulării unei astfel de idei este esențială pentru identificarea utilizatorilor expuși riscului. În această lucrare, ne concentrăm asupra identificării intenției sinucigașe în tweet-uri prin extinderea modelelor lingvistice cu faze emoționale modelate din contextul istoric al utilizatorilor. Propunem FASE, un cadru conștient de timp și fază care învață adaptiv caracteristici din spectrul emoțional istoric al utilizatorului pe Twitter pentru screening preliminar al riscului de sinucidere. Bazându-se pe studiile clinice, PHASE învață progresii fazice în emoțiile istorice bazate pe roata Plutchik ale utilizatorilor pentru a contextualiza intenția sinucigașă. Deși depășim metodele de ultimă generație, arătăm utilitatea indiciilor contextuale emoționale temporale și faziale pentru detectarea ideilor sinucigașe. Discutăm în continuare considerații practice și etice.', 'si': 'අලුත් මානසික විද්\u200dයාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයාත්ම අනිවාර්ය සැකසුම් සැකසුම් කරන්න අවස්ථාවක් අවස්ථාවක් තියෙන ප්\u200dරයෝජකයන්ගේ අවස්ථාවක් ලැබීම මේ වැඩේ අපි අවධානය කරන්නේ තවිට්ට් වල ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක මොඩේල් එක්ක භාවිතාත්මක මොඩේල් එක්ක භාවිතාත්මක අවධානය අපි PHASE ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා, වෙලාව සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තේරුම් ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. PHASE සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාවික අධ්\u200dයානයේ නිර්මාණය කරනවා, ප්\u200dරයෝජකයේ ඉතිහාසික් විද්\u200dයාපකයේ ප්ලුචික්-විල් අධ්\u200dයානය කරනවා ස ස්ථානයේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විධානය නිර්මාණය කරනවා නම්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ කාලයක් සහ පස්සේ අධාරිත හැඟීමේ හැඟීමක් හැඟීමක්  අපි තවදුරටත් පරීක්ෂණාත්මක සහ අධ්\u200dයාත්මක විශ්වාස කරනවා.', 'sr': 'Nedavno psihološke studije ukazuju na to da pojedinci koji pokazuju samoubistvo ideju sve više pretvaraju u društvene medije, a ne praktičnike mentalnog zdravlja. Kontekstualizacija izgradnje takve ideje je kritična za identifikaciju rizičnih korisnika. U ovom poslu, fokusiramo se na identifikaciju samoubistvene namere u tweets povećanjem jezičkih modela sa emocionalnim fazama modeliranim iz istorijskog konteksta korisnika. Predlažemo PHASE, vremenski i fazni okvir koji prilagodno uči karakteristike korisničkog istorijskog emocionalnog spektra na Twitteru za preliminarno snimanje samoubiskog rizika. Na temelju kliničkih ispitivanja, PHASE uči napredak sličnog fazama u istorijskim emocijama korisnika Plutchik-wheel-based da kontekstualiziraju samoubisku namjeru. Dok se izvršavamo metode umjetnosti, pokazujemo korisnost temporalnih i faznih emocionalnih kontekstualnih znakova za otkrivanje ideje samoubistva. Razgovaramo o praktičnim i etičkim razmišljanjima.', 'sv': 'Nyligen genomförda psykologiska studier tyder på att individer som uppvisar självmordstankar i allt högre grad vänder sig till sociala medier snarare än till psykologer. Att kontextualisera uppbyggnaden av sådana idéer är avgörande för identifieringen av användare i riskzonen. I detta arbete fokuserar vi på att identifiera självmordssyfte i tweets genom att utöka språkliga modeller med emotionella faser modellerade utifrån användares historiska kontext. Vi föreslår FASE, ett tids- och fasmedvetet ramverk som adaptivt lär sig funktioner från en användares historiska emotionella spektrum på Twitter för preliminär screening av självmordsrisk. Med utgångspunkt i kliniska studier lär PHASE sig fasliknande progressioner i användares historiska Plutchikhjulsbaserade känslor för att kontextualisera självmordssyfte. Samtidigt som vi överträffar state-of-the-art metoder, visar vi nyttan av tidsmässiga och fasbaserade emotionella kontextuella ledtrådar för upptäckt av självmordstankar. Vi diskuterar vidare praktiska och etiska överväganden.', 'so': "Waxbarashada dhimirka ee soo dhowaaday waxay muujinayaan in qofka u muujiya fikradda suiciyeedka ay sii badnaan u leeyihiin macluumaadka bulshada, taasoo ka bedela bogsiinta caafimaadka dhimirka. Ku baaraandegista dhismaha fikradaas waa muhiim u ah aqoonsiga isticmaalayaasha khatar ku leh. Markaas waxan, waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa si aan u aqoonsanno waxyaabaha suiciyeedka ee Twitteetka, si aan u kordhinno muusikada luuqadda oo la sameynayo marxaladaha hissiga ah oo laga sameynayo qoraalka taariikhda ee isticmaalayaasha. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa PHASE, kaas oo si adag u barta dhaqdhaqaaqa taariikhda xujada ee isticmaalaha ee Twitterka, si loo bandhigeeyo khatar khatar ah. Building on clinical studies, PHASE learns phase-like progressions in users' historical Plutchik-wheel-based emotions to contextualize suicidal intent.  Inta lagu sameynayo qaababka farshaxanka, waxaynu tusnaa isticmaalka waqtiga ah iyo xilliga iskuulka ah ee fikrada suurtagalka. Sidoo kale waxaynu ka sheekeysanaynaa fikrada tababarka iyo asalka ah.", 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில் நிறைந்த முக்கிய ஆராய்ச்சிகள் குறிப்பிடுகிறது அந்த தன்னியக்கூடிய ய யோசனைகளைக் காண்பிக்கின்றனர் என்பது மா இத்தகைய ய யோசனைகளின் கட்டுப்பாட்டை தொடர்ந்து கொள்வது ஆபத்தில் பயனர் அடையாளத்திற்கு முக்கியமானது. இந்த வேலையில், நாம் தெரிந்து கொள்கிறோம் பயனர்களின் வரலாற்று சூழ்நிலையிலிருந்து உணர்வு முறைமைகளை மாற்றியமைக்கும் மூலம் தே நாம் PHASE, ஒரு நேரம் மற்றும் படி உணர்ந்த சட்டத்தை தேர்ந்தெடுக்கிறோம். இது பொருத்தமாக பயனரின் வரலாற்று உணர்வு குறிப்புகளிலிருந்து கற்றுக்கொள்க சில ஆராய்ச்சிகளில் கட்டப்படுகிறது, PHASE பயனர்களின் வரலாற்று ப்ளாட்சிக்- சக்தி சார்ந்த உணர்வுகளில் தானே கொல்லும் நிலையை பொருத்தும்  கலை முறைமைகளை செயல்படுத்தும் போது, நாம் தற்காலிக மற்றும் அடிப்படையிலான உணர்வுப் பொருள் பயன்பாட்டை காட்டுக நாம் மேலும் செயல் மற்றும் இசையல் கருத்துகளை விவாதம் செய்கிறோம்.', 'ur': 'اگلے روانی تحقیقات کی نشانیاں دکھاتے ہیں کہ افراد جنہوں نے suicidal ideation کو زیادہ زیادہ سوسیل میڈیا کی طرف متوجہ ہوتے ہیں بغیر ذهنی سلامتی تحقیقات کرنے والوں کو۔ اس طرح کی ایڈیٹ بنانے کی کنٹیکسٹولیز کرنا خطر داروں کے پہچان کرنے کے لئے ضروری ہے. اس کام میں ہم توئٹوں میں suicidal intention پہچان کرنے کے لئے تمرکز کرتے ہیں کہ زبان ریاضی موڈل کو احساساتی فاز سے زیادہ زیادہ کریں جو کارساز کی تاریخی منظور سے موڈل کئے جاتے ہیں۔ ہم نے PHASE کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے، ایک وقت اور فاز جاننے والی فرمیک جو توئیٹر پر ایک کارساز کی تاریخی احساسات سپکتر سے پہلی سیکرینڈ کی خطر کے لئے اگلوں سے سیکھتا ہے. فاسس نے استعمال کرنے والوں کی تاریخی پلٹچیک-ویل-بنیادی احساسات میں فاسس جیسی پیشرفت سکھائی ہے کہ اپنی جان کے مطابق تدبیر کریں. جبکہ ایٹیٹ کی روش سے بیزار ہوتی ہے، ہم موقت ایڈیٹ شناسایی کے لئے موقت اور فاصلہ کی احساسات کی استفاده دکھاتے ہیں. ہم اچھی طرح عملی اور اخلاقی مشورات سے بحث کرتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Yaqinda psykologik tadqibatlarini anglatadi, odamlar o'zimni sug'ilgan g'oyalarni o'xshash o'ylab o'xshash o'ylab o'zgarishni o'zgartiradi. Bu g'oyalarni ishlab chiqarish xavfli foydalanuvchilarni aniqlash muhim. Bu ishda, biz foydalanuvchilar tarixi tarkibida o'xshash shaklni o'rganish uchun foydalanuvchilar tarixi tarkibidagi hissiyot modellarini qo'shish mumkin. Biz PHASE, vaqt va fash haqida o'xshash freymni o'rganamiz. Bu foydalanuvchi tarixiy hissiyotdan foydalanuvchi hissiyotni Twitter bilan o'rganamiz, biz o'zimni sug'ilgan xavfsizni o'rganish uchun birinchi harakat qilish uchun. Klinik taʼminotlar davomida, PHASE foydalanuvchilar tarixi Plutchik-wheel asosiy hissiyotlarini o'rganadi va o'zimni o'zimga o'xshagan jarayonlarni o'rganadi. Va hodisa saqlash usullarini bajarayotganda, biz sug'ilgan fikrlarni aniqlash uchun vaqt va fash asosida hissiyotga qo'llaniladik. Biz bunday foydalanuvchi va etik fikrlarini boshqaramiz.", 'vi': 'Những nghiên cứu tâm lý gần đây cho thấy những cá nhân biểu hiện ý tưởng tự tử ngày càng hướng tới truyền thông xã hội hơn là bác sĩ sức khỏe tinh thần. Việc áp dụng khả năng tích tụ của ý tưởng này là rất quan trọng để xác định những người đang gặp nguy hiểm. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi tập trung vào việc xác định ý định tự sát trên Twitter bằng cách tăng cường các mô hình ngôn ngữ với các giai đoạn cảm xúc dựa trên lịch sử người dùng. Chúng tôi đề nghị bố trí, một bộ khung thời gian và biết thời gian, thích nghi học các yếu tố trong lịch s ử của người dùng trên Twitter để xem thử rủi ro tự tử sơ bộ. Dựa trên nghiên cứu lâm sàng, Tác dụng học giai đoạn tương ứng trong cảm xúc truyền thống Plutarch-bánh xe để áp dụng tính tự tử. Trong khi trình diễn các phương pháp hiện đại, chúng tôi cho thấy hữu ích của các tác động tình cảm tạm thời và bắt buộc để phát hiện ý định tự tử. Chúng ta còn thảo luận về quan điểm thực tế và đạo đức.', 'bg': 'Последните психологически проучвания показват, че индивидите, проявяващи самоубийствени идеи, все повече се обръщат към социалните медии, отколкото към практикуващите психично здраве. Контекстualiзацията на натрупването на такива идеи е от решаващо значение за идентифицирането на потребителите в риск. В тази работа се фокусираме върху идентифицирането на самоубийствено намерение в туитове чрез увеличаване на лингвистичните модели с емоционални фази, моделирани от историческия контекст на потребителите. Предлагаме ФАЗА, рамка, която адаптивно научава характеристики от историческия емоционален спектър на потребителя в Туитър за предварителен скрининг на риска от самоубийство. Въз основа на клинични проучвания, ФАЗА научава фазови прогресии в историческите емоции на потребителите, базирани на Плучик колело, за да контекстуализира самоубийственото намерение. Докато превъзхождаме най-съвременните методи, ние показваме полезността на временните и фазови емоционални контекстуални знаци за откриване на самоубийствени идеи. Освен това обсъждаме практически и етични съображения.', 'da': 'Nylige psykologiske undersøgelser viser, at personer, der udviser selvmordstanker, i stigende grad vender sig til sociale medier frem for psykiske sundhedspersoner. Kontekstualisering af opbygningen af en sådan idé er afgørende for identifikationen af brugere i fare. I dette arbejde fokuserer vi på at identificere selvmordsmæssige hensigter i tweets ved at forstærke sproglige modeller med følelsesmæssige faser modelleret ud fra brugernes historiske kontekst. Vi foreslår FASE, en tid- og fasebevidst ramme, der adaptivt lærer funktioner fra en brugers historiske følelsesmæssige spektrum på Twitter til foreløbig screening af selvmordsrisiko. Med udgangspunkt i kliniske undersøgelser lærer PHASE faselignende fremskridt i brugernes historiske Plutchik-hjul-baserede følelser for at kontekstualisere selvmordsmæssige hensigter. Mens vi overperformer state-of-the-art metoder, viser vi nytten af tidsmæssige og fasebaserede følelsesmæssige kontekstuelle signaler til detektering af selvmordstanker. Vi diskuterer yderligere praktiske og etiske overvejelser.', 'hr': 'Nedavno psihološke ispitivanja ukazuju na to da pojedinci koji pokazuju samoubojstvenu ideju sve više okreću se socijalnim medijima umjesto praktičnika mentalnog zdravlja. Kontekstualizacija izgradnje takve ideje je kritična za identifikaciju rizičnih korisnika. U tom poslu, usredotočili smo se na identifikaciju samoubojstvene namjere u tweets povećanjem jezičkih modela sa emocionalnim fazama modeliranim iz povijesnog konteksta korisnika. Predlažemo PHASE, vremenski i fazno svjesni okvir koji prilagodno uči karakteristike korisnika povijesnog emocionalnog spektra na Twitter-u za preliminarno pregled samoubiskog rizika. Na temelju kliničkih ispitivanja, PHASE uči postupke slične fazi u istorijskim emocijama korisnika na Plutchik-wheelu kako bi se kontekstualizirala samoubojstvena namjera. Dok se izvršavamo metode umjetnosti, pokazujemo korisnost privremenih i faznih emocionalnih kontekstnih znakova za otkrivanje ideje samoubojstva. Razgovaramo o praktičnim i etičkim razmišljanjima.', 'nl': "Recente psychologische studies wijzen erop dat individuen met zelfmoordgedachten steeds vaker naar sociale media gaan in plaats van naar geestelijke gezondheidswerkers. Het contextualiseren van de opbouw van dergelijke ideeën is cruciaal voor de identificatie van gebruikers die risico lopen. In dit werk richten we ons op het identificeren van suïcidale intenties in tweets door linguïstische modellen uit te breiden met emotionele fasen gemodelleerd uit de historische context van gebruikers. We stellen PHASE voor, een tijd- en fase-bewust kader dat adaptief functies leert van het historische emotionele spectrum van een gebruiker op Twitter voor een voorlopige screening van suïcidale risico's. Voortbouwend op klinische studies leert PHASE faseachtige progressies in de historische Plutchik-wiel-gebaseerde emoties van gebruikers om suïcidale intenties te contextualiseren. Hoewel we beter presteren dan state-of-the-art methoden, tonen we het nut van temporele en fase-gebaseerde emotionele contextuele aanwijzingen voor het detecteren van zelfmoordideeën. We bespreken verder praktische en ethische overwegingen.", 'de': 'Jüngste psychologische Studien deuten darauf hin, dass Personen, die Selbstmordgedanken zeigen, sich zunehmend sozialen Medien zuwenden und nicht Psychotherapeuten. Die Kontextualisierung des Aufbaus solcher Ideen ist entscheidend für die Identifizierung gefährdeter Nutzer. In dieser Arbeit konzentrieren wir uns darauf, Suizidabsichten in Tweets zu identifizieren, indem linguistische Modelle um emotionale Phasen erweitert werden, die aus dem historischen Kontext der Nutzer modelliert wurden. Wir schlagen PHASE vor, ein zeit- und phasenbewusstes Framework, das adaptiv Merkmale aus dem historischen emotionalen Spektrum eines Benutzers auf Twitter lernt, um ein vorläufiges Screening auf Suizidrisiko zu ermöglichen. Aufbauend auf klinischen Studien lernt PHASE phasenartige Progressionen in den historischen Plutchik-Rad-basierten Emotionen der Nutzer kennen, um Suizidabsichten kontextualisieren zu können. Während wir modernste Methoden übertreffen, zeigen wir den Nutzen zeitlicher und phasenbasierter emotionaler kontextueller Hinweise für die Erkennung von Suizidideen. Darüber hinaus diskutieren wir praktische und ethische Überlegungen.', 'fa': 'تحقیقات روانشناسی اخیرا نشان می دهند که افراد که ایده\u200cهای خودکشی را بیشتر به رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی به جای تجربه\u200cکنندگان سلامتی روانی نمایش می\u200cدهند. در کنترل ساختن این ایده برای شناسایی کاربران در خطر مهم است. در این کار، ما روی شناسایی هدف خودکشی در توئیت تمرکز می کنیم با افزایش مدل زبان\u200cشناسی با مرحله\u200cهای احساساتی که از محیط تاریخی کاربران مدل شده است. ما پیشنهاد می کنیم PHASE، یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار بر اساس تحقیقات کلینیکی، PHASE در احساسات تاریخی از چرخه\u200cهای استفاده\u200cها، پیشرفت\u200cهای مانند مرحله\u200cای را یاد می\u200cگیرد تا از هدف خودکشی متوجه شود. در حالی که روش\u200cهای موقعیت هنری را بیرون انجام می\u200cدهیم، ما استفاده از نشانه\u200cهای موقعیت احساساتی بر پایه\u200cهای موقتی و مرحله برای شناسایی ایده\u200cهای خودکشی را نشان می\u200cدهیم. ما در مورد توجه های عملی و اخلاقی بیشتر صحبت می کنیم.', 'sw': 'Tafiti za kisaikolojia za hivi karibuni zinaonyesha kuwa watu wanaoonyesha mawazo ya kujiua yanaongezeka kuelekea kwenye mitandao ya kijamii badala ya watumiaji wa afya ya akili. Kuhusisha ujenzi wa mawazo haya ni muhimu kwa kutambua watumiaji katika hatari. Katika kazi hii, tunalenga kutambua nia ya kujiua katika twiti kwa kuongeza mifano ya lugha yenye hisia zilizotengenezwa kutoka katika mazingira ya kihistoria ya watumiaji. Tunawapendekeza PHASE, mfumo wa muda na wa kiwango kinachofahamika kwa kiasi kikubwa unajifunza utambulisho wa hisia za kihistoria wa mtumiaji kwenye mtandao wa Twita kwa ajili ya kuonyesha hatari ya awali ya kujiua. Kujenga kwenye utafiti wa kliniki, PHASE anajifunza maendeleo yanayofanana na kiwango hicho katika hisia za kihistoria za watumiaji wa Plutchik-wheel ili kuzuia nia ya kujiua. Wakati tukiendesha mbinu za sanaa, tunaonyesha matumizi ya muda na hisia za muda kwa ajili ya kutambua fikra za kujiua. We further discuss practical and ethical considerations.', 'tr': "횦akynda psikolojik ara힊tyrmalar 첵aly adamlar 철z-철z체ni n채hili ide첵asyny g철rke첵채n adamlary mental saglygyny흫 praktikantlaryny흫 첵erine sosial medi첵alaryna 체첵tged첵채rler. B철yle ide첵any bejermek m체mkin ed첵채nleri흫 t철wekili힊ligi tanamak 체챌in wajyp d채ldir. Bu i힊de, ulananlary흫 taryhy kontekstinden 철r채n g철rkezilen du첵umsal nusgalary bilen tweetlerde 철z체ni 철ld체rmek maksadyny tany힊dyrmak 체챌in 체ns체mizi 챌ek첵채ris. Biz PHASE'i, 철z체ni 철wrenmek 체챌in wagt we fas-bilin챌 챌er챌evesini Twitter'y흫 taryhy du첵umsal spektrumyndan 철wrenip, 철z체ni 철wrenmek 체챌in 체첵tged첵채ris. Kliniki ara힊t캇rmalarda guruldy, PHASE qullan캇c캇lary흫 taryhy Plutchik-deplerde 철z체ni ni첵etlendirmek 체챌in f채ze 첵aly 철s체mlikleri 철wren첵채r. I흫 m철h체m d철wletleri 첵체ze 챌ykyp bar첵arken, 철z체ni n채hili adamlary tany힊dyrmak 체챌in wagt we fas d철wletlere gola첵la힊첵an du첵durmany흫 i힊aretini g철rke첵채ris. Biz praktik we etik d체힊체njeleri dowam ed첵채ris.", 'af': "Onlangse psihologiese studies wys dat individuele wat suicidal ideasie verwys het, wat meer groot draai na sosiale media as menslike gesondige praktisers. Die opbou van sodanige ideasie is kritiese vir die identifikasie van gebruikers op risiko. In hierdie werk, ons fokus op die identifiseer van suicidal doel in tweets deur die vergroot lingwisiese modele met emosionele fases wat van gebruikers se historiese konteks modeliseer word. Ons voorstel PHASE, 'n tyd- en fase- bevestig raamwerk wat adaptief leer funksies van 'n gebruiker se historiese emosiele spektrum op Twitter vir vooraf skerm van suicidal risiko. By gebou op kliniske studies, lêer PHASE fase-soos progressies in gebruikers se historiese Plutchik-wheel-gebaseerde emosies om suicidal doel te contextualiseer. Terwyl ons uitvoer state-of-the-art metodes, wys ons die nutsprogram van tydelike en fase-gebaseerde emosionele contextuele tekens vir suicide ideasie-beskrywing. Ons bespreek verder praktiese en etiese aandagings.", 'sq': 'Studimet e fundit psikologjike tregojnë se individët që ekspozojnë idetë vetëvrasëse kthehen gjithnjë e më shumë tek media sociale sesa mjekët e shëndetit mendor. Konteksualizimi i ngritjes së një ide të tillë është kritik për identifikimin e përdoruesve në rrezik. Në këtë punë, ne përqëndrohemi në identifikimin e qëllimit vetëvrasës në Twitter duke rritur modelet gjuhësore me faza emocionale modeluar nga konteksti historik i përdoruesve. Ne propozojmë PHASE, një kuadër i ndërgjegjshëm në kohë dhe fazë që mës on përshtatshëm karakteristika nga spektri emocional historik i përdoruesit në Twitter për shfaqjen paraprake të rrezikut vetëvrasës. Duke u mbështetur në studimet klinike, PHASE mëson progresime të ngjashme me fazën në emocionet historike të përdoruesve të bazuara në Pluçik-rrota për të kontekstualizuar qëllimet vetëvrasëse. Ndërsa ekzistojnë metodat më të mira, ne tregojmë përdorimin e shenjave emocionale kontekstuale për zbulimin e ideve vetëvrasëse. Ne diskutojmë më tej konsiderata praktike dhe etike.', 'am': 'ባለፈው የሲኮሎጂ ትምህርት የራሳቸውን አሳብ በማሳየት ማኅበራዊ አውታር ከmental ጤና ፈቃድ ተሟጋቾች ይልቅ እያሳየቱ ያስታውቃል፡፡ የዚህን አእምሮዎች መሠረት መግለጫ በአስቸኳይ ለሚጠቃቂዎቹ ማውቀት ያስቸጋሪ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ የራሳቸውን ጉዳይ በትዊተር እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በጥያቄው ታሪክ የኢትዮጵያዊው ታሪካዊ ስብሰባዊ ክፍል ለመጀመሪያ የራሳቸውን መፍታት ለመግለጽ በተጠቃሚ ትዊተር ላይ የሚታወቀውን የጊዜና የደረጃ ማወቂያ ፍሬማር እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በቻይሎኒካዊ ትምህርት ላይ በመሠረት፣ PHASE የፍትሕ ደረጃዎችን በተጠቃሚ ፕላክኪ-ቻይል ታሪካዊ ስብሰባዎችን ለራሳቸው የግዳይ አቃውሞ ለመግለጥ ይማራል፡፡ የ-የ-የ-አርእስት ሥርዓት ማሳየት ሲሆን፣ የጊዜው እና የፍጻሜ የኢትዮጵያ ስብሰባዊ ኩነቶች ለራሳቸው አሳብ ማግኘት እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በጥያቄ እና የባሕላዊ አስተያየት እንጨምርባቸዋለን፡፡', 'az': "Son psikolojik təhsil edilənlər təhsil edirlər ki, insanların özünü təhsil edirlər, psikolojik sağlamlıq təhsil edənlərin yerinə sosyal mediyalara daha çox dönüşürlər. Bütün fikirlərin düzəltməsi riskli istifadəçilərin tanıdılması üçün dəhşətlidir. Bu işdə, istifadəçilərin tarixi məsələsindən modelləşdirilmiş emosiyal fəziləri ilə dil modellərini artırmaq üçün tweetlərdə intiqam niyyətini tanıma odaqlanırıq. Biz PHASE'i, zamanı və fəzi-bilən framework ü təklif edirik ki, Twitter'də istifadəçinin tarixəli emosiyal spektrumundan özünü ilk dəfə təhrif etmək üçün istifadəçinin təhrif edir. Kliniki təhsimlərdə in şa edilən, PHASE istifadəçilərin tarixi Plutchik-wheel-based emosiyalarını özünü təhsil etmək üçün fəzi kimi təhsimlər öyrənir. İntihar ideyalarını keşfetmək üçün müddətli və fəsada dayanan emosiyal müxtəlif əlaqələrin istifadəsini göstəririk. Biz daha çox pratik və etik düşüncələrə mübahisə edirik.", 'ko': '최근의 심리학 연구에 따르면 살의욕을 보이는 개인들이 심리 건강 종사자가 아닌 소셜 미디어로 전향하고 있다.이러한 이상화된 구축 배경화는 위험에 처한 사용자를 식별하는 데 매우 중요하다.이 작업에서 우리는 트위터의 자살 의도를 식별하는 데 중점을 둘 것이다. 방법은 사용자의 역사적 배경에서 감정을 모델링하는 단계를 통해 언어 모델을 강화하는 것이다.PHASE는 자살 위험을 초기 체크하는 데 활용할 수 있는 사용자들이 트위터의 역사적 정서보에서 특징을 적응적으로 학습할 수 있는 시간과 단계 감지 프레임워크를 제시했다.임상연구를 바탕으로 PHASE는 이용자 역사상 Plutchik wheel의 정서에 기반한 단계적 진전을 학습함으로써 자살 의도를 배경화했다.가장 선진적인 방법보다 낫지만 시간과 단계를 바탕으로 하는 정서적 배경 단서가 자살의념 검출에서의 효용을 보여줬다.우리는 실천과 윤리 방면의 고려를 진일보 토론했다.', 'id': 'Studi psikologi baru-baru ini menunjukkan bahwa individu yang menunjukkan pemikiran bunuh diri semakin berubah ke media sosial daripada dokter kesehatan mental. Mengkontekstualisasi pembangunan ide seperti itu adalah kritis untuk identifikasi pengguna yang dalam resiko. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami fokus pada mengidentifikasi niat bunuh diri dalam tweet dengan meningkatkan model bahasa dengan fase emosional yang dimodelkan dari konteks sejarah pengguna. Kami mengusulkan PHASE, rangkaian waktu-dan fase-sadar yang secara adaptif mempelajari ciri-ciri dari spektrum emosional sejarah pengguna di Twitter untuk penelitian awal risiko bunuh diri. Berdasarkan studi klinis, PHASE mempelajari progresi seperti fase dalam emosi sejarah pengguna berdasarkan roda Plutchik untuk mengkonteksualisasi tujuan bunuh diri. Sementara melebihi metode state-of-the-art, kami menunjukkan utilitas dari waktu dan fase berdasarkan sinyal kontekstual emosional untuk deteksi ide bunuh diri. Kita lebih lanjut membahas pertimbangan praktis dan etik.', 'hy': "Վերջերս հոգեբանական ուսումնասիրությունները ցույց են տալիս, որ անհատները, ովքեր ինքնասպանական մտքեր են ցույց տալիս, ավելի ու ավելի խոսում են սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների վրա, քան մտավոր առողջության մասնագետների Այսպիսի գաղափարների կառուցվածքի կոնտեքստալացումը կարևոր է ռիսկային օգտագործողների հայտնաբերման համար: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք կենտրոնանում ենք ինքնասպանության նպատակների հայտնաբերման վրա թվիթերում, բարձրացնելով լեզվաբանական մոդելները՝ զգացմունքային դեպքերով, որոնք մոդելվում են օգտագործողների պատմական կոնտեքստից: Մենք առաջարկում ենք PHASE-ը, ժամանակի և ֆասանի գիտակցության շրջանակ, որը ադապտիվ սովորում է հատկանիշներ օգտագործողի պատմական էմոցիոնալ սպեկտրից Թվիթերում ինքնասպանության ռիսկի նախաձեռն վերահսկման համար: Building on clinical studies, PHASE learns phase-like progressions in users' historical Plutchik-wheel-based emotions to contextualize suicidal intent.  Մինչդեռ ամենաբարձր մեթոդները գերազանցում են, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս ժամանակակից և ֆեզիայից հիմնված էմոցիոնալ կոնտեքստոնալ նշանները ինքնասպան մտքերի հայտնաբերման համար: Մենք նաև քննարկում ենք պրակտիկ և էթիկական մտածողությունները:", 'bs': 'Nedavno psihološke ispitivanja ukazuju na to da pojedinci koji pokazuju samoubojstvenu ideju sve više okreću se socijalnim medijima, a ne praktičari mentalnog zdravlja. Kontekstualizacija izgradnje takve ideje je kritična za identifikaciju rizičnih korisnika. U ovom poslu, fokusiramo se na identifikaciju samoubojstvene namjere u tweets povećanjem jezičkih modela sa emocionalnim fazama modeliranim iz istorijskog konteksta korisnika. Predlažemo PHASE, vremenski i fazni okvir koji prilagodno uči karakteristike iz istorijskog emocionalnog spektra korisnika na Twitter-u za preliminarno pregled samoubiskog rizika. Na temelju kliničkih ispitivanja, PHASE uči progresije slične fazama u istorijskim emocijama korisnika na Plutchik-wheelu kako bi se kontekstualizirala samoubojstvena namjera. Dok se izvršavamo metode umjetnosti, pokazujemo korisnost privremenih i faznih emocionalnih kontekstualnih znakova za otkrivanje ideje samoubistva. Razgovaramo o praktičnim i etičkim razmišljanjima.', 'cs': 'Nedávné psychologické studie ukazují, že jedinci vykazující sebevražedné myšlenky se stále častěji obrací na sociální média spíše než na lékaře duševního zdraví. Kontextualizace budování takových myšlenek je klíčová pro identifikaci ohrožených uživatelů. V této práci se zaměřujeme na identifikaci sebevražedných záměrů ve tweetech rozšířením lingvistických modelů o emoční fáze modelované z historického kontextu uživatelů. Navrhujeme PHASE, časově a fázově orientovaný rámec, který adaptivně učí funkce z historického emočního spektra uživatele na Twitteru pro předběžné screening sebevražedného rizika. Na základě klinických studií se PHASE učí fázově podobné postupy v historických emocích uživatelů založených na Plutchikových kolech a kontextualizuje sebevražedné záměry. Přestože překonáváme nejmodernější metody, ukazujeme užitečnost časových a fázových emočních kontextových návodů pro detekci sebevražedných myšlenek. Dále diskutujeme o praktických a etických úvahách.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক মানসিক গবেষণা নির্দেশ করছে যে মানসিক স্বাস্থ্য প্রশিক্ষকদের পরিবর্তে ব্যক্তিরা আত্মহত্যাকাণ্ডের চিন্তা  ব্যবহারকারীদের বিপদের পরিচয় চিহ্নিত করার জন্য এই ধরনের চিন্তার বিন্যাস বানানো গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। এই কাজে আমরা টুইটে আত্মহত্যার উদ্দেশ্য চিহ্নিত করি ব্যবহারকারীদের ঐতিহাসিক প্রেক্ষাপট থেকে আত্মহত্যাকাণ্ডের মডেল বৃদ্ধি করে ভা আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি সময় এবং পর্যায় সচেতনতার একটি ফ্রেক্কার যেখানে ব্যবহারকারীর ঐতিহাসিক আবেগের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি টুইটারে প্রথম আত্মহত্যার ঝুঁকি দেখার জন্ ক্লিনিকিন্যাল গবেষণা নির্মাণ করার জন্য পাহেস ব্যবহারকারীদের ঐতিহাসিক প্লাটচিক-হুইল ভিত্তিক অনুভূতিতে ক্ষেত্রের মতো অগ্রগতি শিখে যখন শিল্পের রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প পদ্ধতি প্রদর্শন করা হয়, তখন আমরা আত্মহত্যাকাণ্ড সনাক্ত করার জন্য সাময়িক এবং ফেস ভিত্তিক অনুভূতির ব্যবহার প্ আমরা আরো প্রাকৃতিক এবং নৈতিক বিষয় নিয়ে আলোচনা করি।', 'ca': "Els estudis psicològics recents indican que les persones que mostran idees suïcidàries es dirigeixen cada cop més als mitjans socials en comptes de als metges de salut mental. El contextualitzar la creació d'aquestes idees és crucial per identificar els usuaris en risc. En aquesta feina, ens centrem en identificar la intenció suïcida en els tweets augmentant els models lingüístics amb fases emocionals modelades pel contexte històric dels usuaris. We propose PHASE, a time-and phase-aware framework that adaptively learns features from a user's historical emotional spectrum on Twitter for preliminary screening of suicidal risk.  A partir d'estudis clínics, PHASE aprenen progressions en fase en les emocions històriques dels usuaris basades en Plutchik per contextualitzar l'intenció suïcida. Mentre superem els mètodes més avançats, demostram l'utilitat d'indicacions emocionals contextuals temporals i fases per detectar idees suïcides. We further discuss practical and ethical considerations.", 'et': 'Hiljutised psühholoogilised uuringud näitavad, et enesetapumõtetega inimesed pöörduvad üha enam sotsiaalmeedia poole, mitte vaimse tervise spetsialistide poole. Selliste ideede tekkimise kontekstualiseerimine on ohustatud kasutajate tuvastamiseks äärmiselt oluline. Käesolevas töös keskendume enesetapukavatsuse tuvastamisele säutsudes, täiendades keelelisi mudeleid emotsionaalsete faasidega, mis on modelleeritud kasutajate ajaloolisest kontekstist. Pakume välja PHASE, aja- ja faasiteadliku raamistiku, mis õpib kohanduvalt Twitteris kasutaja ajaloolisest emotsionaalsest spektrist omadusi enesetapuriski esialgseks sõelumiseks. Tuginedes kliinilistele uuringutele, õpib PHASE faasilaadseid progressioone kasutajate ajaloolistes Plutchik-rattapõhistes emotsioonides, et kontekstualiseerida enesetapukavatsust. Kuigi me ületame kaasaegseid meetodeid, näitame ajaliste ja faasipõhiste emotsionaalsete kontekstuaalsete vihjete kasulikkust enesetapumõtete tuvastamiseks. Lisaks arutame praktilisi ja eetilisi kaalutlusi.', 'fi': 'Viimeaikaiset psykologiset tutkimukset osoittavat, että itsemurha-ajatuksia osoittavat henkilöt kääntyvät yhä enemmän sosiaalisen median puoleen mielenterveyden ammattilaisten sijaan. Tällaisen ideaation muodostumisen kontekstualisointi on ratkaisevan tärkeää riskikäyttäjien tunnistamiseksi. Tässä työssä keskitytään tunnistamaan itsemurha-aikeita tweeteissä lisäämällä kielellisiä malleja, joiden tunnevaiheita mallinnetaan käyttäjien historiallisesta kontekstista. Ehdotamme PHASE-järjestelmää, joka oppii mukautuvasti käyttäjän historiallisesta tunnespektristä ominaisuuksia Twitterissä itsemurhariskin alustavaa seulontaa varten. Kliinisten tutkimusten pohjalta PHASE oppii vaiheittaista etenemistä käyttäjien historiallisissa Plutchik-wheel-pohjaisissa tunteissa itsetuhoisen tarkoituksen kontekstualisoimiseksi. Suorittaessamme viimeisimpiä menetelmiä näytämme ajallisten ja vaihetietoisten kontekstuaalisten vihjeiden hyödyllisyyttä itsemurhaajatusten havaitsemisessa. Keskustelemme myös käytännön ja eettisistä näkökohdista.', 'ha': "Ana karatun kisaikoloji da suka yanzu cewa, mutane sun nuna zafi-faranta ga mutane yana ƙara zuwa mitandai da jami musammani, kuma ba da tsari ga mataimaki. Kima muhimu a sami-up na wannan fikanci don ka gane wa mai amfani da shi a kan hatsi. Daga wannan aikin, Munã fokus zuwa a gane ta'ura masu fara da kansa, a cikin Twitter, kuma mu ƙara misalin linguistic da aka samo fasafan hisabi da aka samo daga mazaƙin historin mai amfani da. Muke goyyar da PSA, wata firam mai bayani na lokaci da fasa wanda yana iya amfani da shi, yana karatun wasu mutane daga bakin hisori na mai amfani da shi na'ura a Twitter don ya yi fara-gyalin kwamfyuta ta fara-fara halin ya kashe kansa. Buning kan karatun da aka ƙayyade, PHSA yana karanta sigarin misalin fasa cikin hisorin na masu amfani da mai amfani da kwamfyutan-na'ura na Plathik-rato dõmin ya konstanta wajen aikin kansa. A lokacin da za'a samar da halin-na-sanar, za mu nuna amfani da masu amfani da amfani da mutanen da ke asansa da hisia'a masu kashewa wa masu kashewa. We further discuss practical and ethical considerations.", 'sk': 'Nedavne psihološke študije kažejo, da se posamezniki s samomorilnimi mislimi vedno bolj obračajo na družbena omrežja kot na delavce duševnega zdravja. Kontekstualizacija kopičenja takšnih idej je ključnega pomena za identifikacijo ogroženih uporabnikov. V tem delu se osredotočamo na prepoznavanje samomorilnega namena v tweetih z izboljšanjem jezikovnih modelov s čustvenimi fazami, modeliranimi iz zgodovinskega konteksta uporabnikov. Predlagamo FASE, časovno in fazno ozaveščen okvir, ki se prilagodljivo uči značilnosti iz uporabnikovega zgodovinskega čustvenega spektra na Twitterju za predhodno presejanje samomorilnega tveganja. Na podlagi kliničnih študij se FASE uči faznim napredovanjem v zgodovinskih čustvih uporabnikov, ki temeljijo na Plutchikovih kolesih, da kontekstualizira samomorilni namen. Medtem ko presegamo najsodobnejše metode, pokažemo uporabnost časovnih in faznih čustvenih kontekstualnih namigov za odkrivanje samomorilskih idej. Nadalje razpravljamo o praktičnih in etičnih vidikih.', 'jv': "Kowé kamulang maneh perbudhakan langkung wigatining uwong-uwong sing ngerasakno tentang luwih dumadhi media sokuluh sing bisa basa sing apik sing ora oleh operasi sing apik. I Nang gunggo iki, kita dipontrolaké nêmên langgar sami ngêngguna perusahaan winih kanggo ngilangno nggawe modèl lengrungsik karo perusahaan langgar-langgar sapa nyimpen winih. Awak dhéwé ngerti, pisan lan babagan barang nggawe Perintahaan kuwi tau ngomong nik nambarang kelas karo perusahaan empresmi sing apik dhéwé kuwi Tutuk. Mulai nggawe klénisik arah, phase-like progress in user's history Mungkin nggawe barang kelas-perbudhakan langgar-akeh pisan, kita nguasai nggawe barang langgar-akeh susahe seneng pisan kuwi kesempatan kanggo nguasai perbudhakan winih. Awak dhéwé pisan seneng pisan pratiki lan ètiki.", 'he': "מחקרים פסיכולוגיים לאחרונה מצביעים על כך שאנשים שמופגים רעיונות התאבדות פונים יותר ויותר לתקשורת חברתית במקום למקצועי בריאות נפשית. Contextualizing the build-up of such ideation is critical for the identification of users at risk.  In this work, we focus on identifying suicidal intent in tweets by augmenting linguistic models with emotional phases modeled from users' historical context.  אנו מציעים שלב, מסגרת מודעת לזמן ובשלב שתלמד באופן מתאים מאפיינים מהספקטרום הרגשי היסטורי של משתמש בטוויטר לבדיקה קודמית של סיכון התאבדות. בהתבסס על מחקרים קליניים, PHASE לומד התקדמות כמו שלב ברגשות ההיסטוריות של המשתמשים מבוססים על גלגלים Plutchik בזמן שעובדים על שיטות מוקדמות, אנו מראים את היעילות של סימני תקשורת רגשיים זמניים ומבוססים בשלב לזיהוי רעיונות התאבדות. אנחנו מדברים יותר על חשיבות מעשיות ואתיות.", 'bo': "ད་ལྟ་མ་འོངས་པར་ཕྱོགས་སྤེལ་བ་དེ་ནི་སྒེར་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་འཐབ་པའི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་སྣང་མེད་པའི་ནང་དུ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེ ཞིབ་འཇུག་སྟངས་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་དེ་གླེང་སྐྱོང་བའི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ངོ་འཛིན་ཏུ་ཆེན་ཤུགས་ཡོད། In this work, we focus on identifying suicidal intent in tweets by increasing linguistic models with emotional phases modeled from users' historical context. We propose PHASE, a time-and phase-aware framework that adaptively learns features from a user's historical emotional spectrum on Twitter for preliminary screening of suicidal risk. Building on clinical studies, PHASE learns phase-like progressions in users' historical Plutchik-wheel-based emotions to contextualize suicidal intent. དེ་ལས་འཕར་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་གཙོ་བ་དེ་འོས་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ནི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་ལག་ལེན་དང་སྲོལ་རིམ་གྱི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་བར་གཏོང་བྱེད།"}
{'en': 'Exploiting Definitions for Frame Identification', 'ar': 'استغلال التعاريف لتعريف الإطار', 'es': 'Aprovechar las definiciones para la identificación de marcos', 'pt': 'Explorando Definições para Identificação de Quadros', 'fr': "Exploitation des définitions pour l'identification des trames", 'ja': 'フレーム識別の定義の利用', 'hi': 'फ़्रेम पहचान के लिए परिभाषाओं का शोषण करना', 'zh': '因帻识之义', 'ru': 'Эксплуатация определений для идентификации фрейма', 'ga': 'Leas a Bhaint as Sainmhínithe le haghaidh Aithint Fráma', 'ka': 'Comment', 'hu': 'A keret azonosítására vonatkozó meghatározások kihasználása', 'el': 'Αξιοποίηση ορισμών για τον προσδιορισμό πλαισίου', 'it': "Sfruttare le definizioni per l'identificazione del telaio", 'kk': 'Фрейм идентификациясының анықтамалары', 'lt': 'Įrašų identifikavimo apibrėžimų naudojimas', 'ms': 'Menggunakan Definisi untuk Pengenalan Bingkai', 'mk': 'Користење дефиниции за идентификација на рамка', 'ml': 'ഫ്രെയിം തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനുള്ള വിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തിറങ്ങുന്നു', 'mt': 'L-isfruttament tad-Definizzjonijiet għall-Identifikazzjoni tal-Qafas', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie definicji do identyfikacji ramek', 'ro': 'Exploatarea definițiilor pentru identificarea cadrului', 'si': 'ෆ්\u200dරේම් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා විවෘත විවෘත', 'no': 'Name', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha aqoonsiga Frame', 'sv': 'Utnyttja definitioner för ramidentifiering', 'ta': 'சட்டத்தின் அடையாளத்திற்கான வெளியீட்டு வரையறைகள்', 'ur': 'فرم شناسایی کے لئے تعریف پھیلانے', 'mn': 'Фрейм идентификацийн тодорхойлолтуудыг тайлбарлах', 'sr': 'Eksplozirajući definicije za identifikaciju okvira', 'uz': 'Freymni aniqlash uchun tuzilmoqda', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Използване на определенията за идентификация на рамката', 'nl': 'Gebruik maken van definities voor frameondentificatie', 'da': 'Udnyttelse af definitioner til rammeidentifikation', 'hr': 'Eksplozirajući definicije za okvirnu identifikaciju', 'de': 'Nutzung von Definitionen für die Frame-Identifizierung', 'id': 'Mengeksploitasi Definisi untuk Identifikasi Bingkai', 'fa': 'توسعه تعریف شناسایی چشمه', 'sw': 'Mpango wa Mpango wa Kutambua Ufanuzi wa Frame', 'tr': 'Däşer Kimligi üçin Wasp', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Shfrytëzimi i përcaktimeve për identifikimin e kornizës', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Exploiting Definitions for Frame Identification', 'bn': 'ফ্রেম পরিচয় পরিচয়ের জন্য অপ্লোগ করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Eksplozirajući definicije za identifikaciju okvira', 'ko': '프레임 식별을 이용한 정의', 'az': '칂er톛m Kimlikl톛ri', 'ca': 'Utilitzant definicions per identificar marcs', 'et': 'Raami identifitseerimise määratluste kasutamine', 'cs': 'Využití definicí pro identifikaci rámců', 'fi': 'Kehyksen tunnistamisen määritelmien hyödyntäminen', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'sk': 'Izkoriščanje opredelitev pojmov za identifikacijo okvirja', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Frame Identification ཡིག་ལ་གཏོང་གཏོང་གཏོང་གཏོང', 'he': 'ניצל הגדרות לזהות המפלגה'}
{'en': 'Frame identification is one of the key challenges for frame-semantic parsing. The goal of this task is to determine which frame best captures the meaning of a target word or phrase in a sentence. We present a new model for frame identification that uses a pre-trained transformer model to generate representations for frames and lexical units (senses) using their formal definitions in FrameNet. Our frame identification model assesses the suitability of a frame for a target word in a sentence based on the semantic coherence of their meanings. We evaluate our model on three data sets and show that it consistently achieves better performance than previous systems.', 'ar': 'يعد تحديد الإطار أحد التحديات الرئيسية للتحليل الدلالي للإطار. الهدف من هذه المهمة هو تحديد الإطار الأفضل الذي يجسد معنى الكلمة أو العبارة المستهدفة في الجملة. نقدم نموذجًا جديدًا لتحديد الإطار يستخدم نموذج محول مُدرَّب مسبقًا لإنشاء تمثيلات للإطارات والوحدات المعجمية (الحواس) باستخدام تعريفاتها الرسمية في FrameNet. يقوم نموذج تحديد الإطار الخاص بنا بتقييم مدى ملاءمة الإطار للكلمة المستهدفة في الجملة بناءً على التماسك الدلالي لمعانيها. نقوم بتقييم نموذجنا على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات ونوضح أنه يحقق باستمرار أداءً أفضل من الأنظمة السابقة.', 'pt': 'A identificação de quadros é um dos principais desafios para a análise semântica de quadros. O objetivo desta tarefa é determinar qual quadro melhor captura o significado de uma palavra ou frase alvo em uma frase. Apresentamos um novo modelo de identificação de quadros que utiliza um modelo de transformador pré-treinado para gerar representações para quadros e unidades lexicais (sentidos) usando suas definições formais no FrameNet. Nosso modelo de identificação de quadros avalia a adequação de um quadro para uma palavra-alvo em uma frase com base na coerência semântica de seus significados. Avaliamos nosso modelo em três conjuntos de dados e mostramos que ele alcança consistentemente um desempenho melhor do que os sistemas anteriores.', 'fr': "L'identification des trames est l'un des principaux défis de l'analyse sémantique des trames. L'objectif de cette tâche est de déterminer quel cadre saisit le mieux le sens d'un mot ou d'une phrase cible dans une phrase. Nous présentons un nouveau modèle d'identification de trames qui utilise un modèle de transformateur pré-entraîné pour générer des représentations pour les trames et les unités lexicales (sens) à l'aide de leurs définitions formelles dans FrameNet. Notre modèle d'identification de cadre évalue la pertinence d'un cadre pour un mot cible dans une phrase en fonction de la cohérence sémantique de leurs significations. Nous évaluons notre modèle sur trois ensembles de données et montrons qu'il atteint constamment de meilleures performances que les systèmes précédents.", 'es': 'La identificación de tramas es uno de los desafíos clave para el análisis semántico de tramas. El objetivo de esta tarea es determinar qué marco captura mejor el significado de una palabra o frase objetivo en una oración. Presentamos un nuevo modelo para la identificación de marcos que utiliza un modelo de transformador previamente entrenado para generar representaciones para marcos y unidades léxicas (sentidos) utilizando sus definiciones formales en FrameNet. Nuestro modelo de identificación de marcos evalúa la idoneidad de un marco para una palabra objetivo en una oración en función de la coherencia semántica de sus significados. Evaluamos nuestro modelo en tres conjuntos de datos y demostramos que logra un mejor rendimiento de manera consistente que los sistemas anteriores.', 'ja': 'フレーム識別は、フレーム-セマンティック構文解析の重要な課題の1つです。このタスクの目標は、どのフレームが文章内のターゲット単語またはフレーズの意味を最もよく捕捉するかを決定することです。私たちは、事前にトレーニングされた変圧器モデルを使用して、FrameNetの形式的な定義を使用してフレームおよび語彙単位（センス）の表現を生成するフレーム識別のための新しいモデルを提示します。フレーム識別モデルは、文の中のターゲットワードに対するフレームの意味の意味論的一貫性に基づいて、フレームの適合性を評価します。私たちは、3つのデータセットに基づいてモデルを評価し、それが以前のシステムよりも一貫して優れたパフォーマンスを達成していることを示します。', 'zh': '帻识者,帻语义解析之主也。 此定何帻最能得句单词或短语之义。 新帻识模,先练转换器模,FrameNet义词法单元(感官)生。 吾帻识模形以句中单词义语义一致性评框架句中单词适用性。 三数集上质,以明终始。', 'hi': 'फ़्रेम पहचान फ़्रेम-सिमेंटिक पार्सिंग के लिए प्रमुख चुनौतियों में से एक है। इस कार्य का लक्ष्य यह निर्धारित करना है कि कौन सा फ्रेम एक वाक्य में लक्ष्य शब्द या वाक्यांश के अर्थ को सबसे अच्छा कैप्चर करता है। हम फ्रेम पहचान के लिए एक नया मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो फ्रेमनेट में अपनी औपचारिक परिभाषाओं का उपयोग करके फ्रेम और लेक्सिकल इकाइयों (इंद्रियों) के लिए अभ्यावेदन उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित ट्रांसफॉर्मर मॉडल का उपयोग करता है। हमारा फ्रेम पहचान मॉडल उनके अर्थों के शब्दार्थ सुसंगतता के आधार पर एक वाक्य में एक लक्ष्य शब्द के लिए एक फ्रेम की उपयुक्तता का आकलन करता है। हम तीन डेटा सेट पर अपने मॉडल का मूल्यांकन करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि यह लगातार पिछले सिस्टम की तुलना में बेहतर प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Идентификация кадров является одной из ключевых проблем для фрейм-семантического синтаксического анализа. Цель этой задачи - определить, какой кадр лучше всего отражает значение целевого слова или фразы в предложении. Мы представляем новую модель идентификации кадров, которая использует предварительно обученную модель трансформатора для создания представлений для кадров и лексических единиц (органов чувств) с использованием их формальных определений в FrameNet. Наша модель идентификации кадров оценивает пригодность кадра для целевого слова в предложении на основе семантической согласованности их значений. Мы оцениваем нашу модель по трем наборам данных и показываем, что она последовательно достигает лучшей производительности, чем предыдущие системы.', 'ga': 'Tá sainaithint fráma ar cheann de na príomhdhúshláin don pharsáil fráma-shéimeantach. Is é sprioc an taisc seo ná a fháil amach cén fráma is fearr a ghlacann brí spriocfhocail nó frása in abairt. Cuirimid múnla nua i láthair maidir le haithint fráma a úsáideann múnla claochladán réamhoilte chun léiriúcháin a ghiniúint le haghaidh frámaí agus aonad foclóireachta (céadfaí) ag baint úsáide as a sainmhínithe foirmiúla in FrameNet. Déanann ár múnla aitheantais fráma measúnú ar oiriúnacht fráma do spriocfhocal in abairt bunaithe ar chomhleanúnachas shéimeantach a gcuid bríonna. Déanaimid luacháil ar ár múnla ar thrí thacar sonraí agus léirímid go mbaineann sé feidhmíocht níos fearr amach go comhsheasmhach ná córais roimhe seo.', 'ka': 'პარამეტრის ინდიდენტიფიკაცია არის ერთი კლავის გამოცდილებების პარამენტიკის გასაკეთება. ამ დავალების მისამართი არის განსაზღვრება, რომელიც საუკეთესო ფრამის სიტყვის ან ფრაზის სიტყვის შესანიშნავს. ჩვენ ჩვენ ახალი მოდელს ფრამების ინდენტიფიკაციისთვის, რომელიც გამოყენებს პრეტრუმენტერის მოდელს, რომელიც გამოყენება ფრამებისთვის და ლექსიკალური ერთეულების განსაზღვრებისთვის, რო ჩვენი ფრამების ინდიდინტიფიკაციის მოდელი განსაზღვრებს ფრამების შესაძლებლობას მინიშვნელოვანი სიტყვის სიტყვის, რომელიც განსაზღვრებულია ისინი სანიშვნელოვანების სმენტიკ ჩვენ ჩვენი მოდელს სამი მონაცემების შესახებ გავამუშავებთ და ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენი მოდელს ჩვენი შესახებ, რომ ეს მუშაობელად უფრო მუშაობა,', 'hu': 'A keret azonosítása a keret-szemantikai elemzés egyik legfontosabb kihívása. Ennek a feladatnak az a célja, hogy meghatározza, melyik keret fogja legjobban a célszó vagy kifejezés jelentését egy mondatban. Bemutatunk egy új modellt a keretek azonosítására, amely egy előre képzett transzformátor modellt használ a keretek és lexikális egységek (érzékek) reprezentációinak generálására a FrameNet formális definícióit használva. Keret-azonosító modellünk értékeli egy keret alkalmasságát egy mondatban a célszó számára, jelentésük szemantikai koherenciája alapján. Modellünket három adatkészleten értékeljük, és megmutatjuk, hogy következetesen jobb teljesítményt ér el, mint a korábbi rendszerek.', 'el': 'Ο προσδιορισμός πλαισίου είναι μια από τις βασικές προκλήσεις για τη σημασιολογική ανάλυση πλαισίων. Ο στόχος αυτής της εργασίας είναι να καθορίσει ποιο πλαίσιο αποτυπώνει καλύτερα την έννοια μιας λέξης-στόχου ή φράσης σε μια πρόταση. Παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο αναγνώρισης πλαισίων που χρησιμοποιεί ένα προ-εκπαιδευμένο μοντέλο μετασχηματιστή για την παραγωγή αναπαραστάσεων για πλαίσια και λεξικές μονάδες (αισθήσεις) χρησιμοποιώντας τους τυπικούς ορισμούς τους στο FrameNet. Το μοντέλο αναγνώρισης πλαισίου αξιολογεί την καταλληλότητα ενός πλαισίου για μια λέξη-στόχο σε μια πρόταση με βάση τη σημασιολογική συνοχή των εννοιών τους. Αξιολογούμε το μοντέλο μας σε τρία σύνολα δεδομένων και αποδεικνύουμε ότι επιτυγχάνει σταθερά καλύτερη απόδοση από τα προηγούμενα συστήματα.', 'it': "L'identificazione dei frame è una delle sfide chiave per l'analisi semantica dei frame. L'obiettivo di questo compito è determinare quale frame cattura meglio il significato di una parola o frase di destinazione in una frase. Presentiamo un nuovo modello per l'identificazione dei fotogrammi che utilizza un modello di trasformatore pre-addestrato per generare rappresentazioni di fotogrammi e unità lessicali (sensi) utilizzando le loro definizioni formali in FrameNet. Il nostro modello di identificazione frame valuta l'idoneità di un frame per una parola target in una frase in base alla coerenza semantica dei loro significati. Valutiamo il nostro modello su tre set di dati e dimostriamo che raggiunge costantemente prestazioni migliori rispetto ai sistemi precedenti.", 'mk': 'Frame identification is one of the key challenges for frame-semantic parsing.  Целта на оваа задача е да се одреди кој рамка најдобро го прифаќа значењето на збор или фраза во реченица. Презентираме нов модел за идентификација на рамка кој користи предобучен модел за трансформирање за генерирање на претставувања за рамки и лексикални единици (сетила) користејќи ги нивните формални дефиниции во FrameNet. Нашиот модел за идентификација на рамка ја проценува соодветноста на рамка за целен збор во реченица базирана на семантичната кохеренција на нивните значења. Го проценуваме нашиот модел на три податоци и покажуваме дека постојано постигнува подобра перформанса од претходните системи.', 'ms': 'Pengenalan bingkai adalah salah satu cabaran kunci untuk penghuraian bingkai-semantik. Tujuan tugas ini adalah menentukan bingkai mana yang terbaik menangkap makna kata sasaran atau frasa dalam kalimat. Kami perkenalkan model baru untuk pengenalpasti bingkai yang menggunakan model penukar terlatih-terlatih untuk menghasilkan perwakilan bagi bingkai dan unit leksikal (senses) menggunakan definisi rasmi mereka dalam FrameNet. Model pengenalan bingkai kami menilai kemampuan bingkai untuk perkataan sasaran dalam kalimat berdasarkan kesamaan semantik makna mereka. Kami menilai model kami pada tiga set data dan menunjukkan bahawa ia secara konsisten mencapai prestasi yang lebih baik daripada sistem sebelumnya.', 'kk': 'Фрейм идентификациясы - фрейм- семантикалық талдау үшін бір кілтті шақырулардың бірі. Бұл тапсырманың мақсаты - мақсатты сөз не сөздің мақсатын анықтау. Біз фрейм идентификациясының жаңа үлгісін таңдаймыз. Бұл фреймдер мен лексикалық бірліктер (сезімдер) үшін Фреймнеттегі официалдық анықтамаларды қолданатын түрлендіруші үлгісін қолданатын Біздің фрейм идентификациясы үлгісіміз, мәліметтерінің семантикалық соғыстығына негізделген сөздің мақсатты сөздің қолдануын анықтайды. Біз үш деректер жиынында моделімізді бағалап, оны алдыңғы жүйелерден жақсы жұмыс істейтінін көрсетедік.', 'lt': 'Frame identification is one of the key challenges for frame-semantic parsing.  Šios užduoties tikslas – nustatyti, kuri sistema geriausiai atitinka tikslinio žodžio ar frazės reikšmę sakinyje. Pateikiame naują rėmų identifikavimo model į, kuriame naudojamas iš anksto parengtas transformatoriaus modelis, kad būtų galima sukurti rėmų ir lexinių vienetų (jutimų) atstovavimus naudojant jų oficialias apibrėžtis FrameNet. Mūsų pagrindų identifikavimo modelis vertina, ar tikslinio žodžio pagrindas tinkamas sakinyje, pagrįstame jų reikšmių semantine nuoseklumu. Vertiname savo model į pagal tris duomenų rinkinius ir rodome, kad jis nuosekliai užtikrina geresnius rezultatus nei ankstesnės sistemos.', 'mt': 'L-identifikazzjoni tal-qafas hija waħda mill-isfidi ewlenin għall-analiżi semantika tal-qafas. L-għan ta’ dan il-kompitu huwa li jiġi ddeterminat liema qafas jaqbad l-a ħjar it-tifsira ta’ kelma jew frażi fil-mira f’sentenza. We present a new model for frame identification that uses a pre-trained transformer model to generate representations for frames and lexical units (senses) using their formal definitions in FrameNet.  Il-mudell ta’ identifikazzjoni tal-qafas tagħna jivvaluta l-adegwatezza ta’ qafas għal kelma fil-mira f’sentenza bbażata fuq il-koerenza semantika tat-tifsiriet tagħhom. Aħna nivvalutaw il-mudell tagħna fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta u nuru li b’mod konsistenti tikseb prestazzjoni aħjar mis-sistemi preċedenti.', 'ml': 'ഫ്രെയിമിന്റെ തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d ഫ്രെയിംഗ് സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വില ഈ ജോലിയുടെ ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം ഒരു വാക്കിലോ വാക്കുകളിലോ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല ഫ്രെയിമിന്റെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം പിടിക്കുന്നത് എന് ഫ്രെയിമെന്റിലെ ഫ്രെയിമില്\u200d നിരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഫ്രെയിമില്\u200d നിന്നും ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d യൂണിറ്റുകള്\u200dക്കും പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന് നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമ്മിലെ തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള മോഡല്\u200d അവയുടെ അര്\u200dത്ഥങ്ങളുടെ സെമാന്റിക്ക് കൂട്ടത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d ഒര മൂന്നു ഡേറ്റാ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുകയും, മുമ്പുള്ള സിസ്റ്റമുകളെക്കാള്\u200d നല്', 'pl': 'Identyfikacja ramek jest jednym z kluczowych wyzwań dla parsowania semantycznego ramki. Celem tego zadania jest określenie, która ramka najlepiej odzwierciedla znaczenie docelowego słowa lub frazy w zdaniu. Przedstawiamy nowy model identyfikacji klatek, który wykorzystuje wstępnie przeszkolony model transformatora do generowania reprezentacji klatek i jednostek leksykalnych (zmysłów) przy użyciu ich definicji formalnych w FrameNet. Nasz model identyfikacji ramki ocenia przydatność ramki dla słowa docelowego w zdaniu na podstawie semantycznej spójności ich znaczeń. Oceniamy nasz model na trzech zbiorach danych i pokazujemy, że konsekwentnie osiąga lepszą wydajność niż poprzednie systemy.', 'ro': 'Identificarea cadrelor este una dintre provocările cheie pentru analizarea cadrelor semantice. Scopul acestei sarcini este de a determina care cadru captează cel mai bine sensul unui cuvânt țintă sau al unei fraze într-o propoziție. Vă prezentăm un nou model de identificare a cadrelor care utilizează un model de transformator pre-instruit pentru a genera reprezentări pentru cadre și unități lexicale (simțuri) folosind definițiile lor formale în FrameNet. Modelul nostru de identificare a cadrelor evaluează adecvarea unui cadru pentru un cuvânt țintă într-o propoziție bazată pe coerența semantică a semnificațiilor acestora. Evaluăm modelul nostru pe trei seturi de date și demonstrăm că obține în mod constant performanțe mai bune decât sistemele anterioare.', 'mn': 'Фрейм идентификацийн нэг нь фрэйм-semantic шинжилгээний чухал сорилтуудын нэг юм. Энэ үйлдлийн зорилго гэвэл зорилготой үг эсвэл үгийн утгыг хамгийн сайн тодорхойлж байгаа фрэймийг тодорхойлох юм. Бид Фрейм идентификацийн шинэ загварыг тайлбарлаж байгаа юм. Фрейм болон лексикийн нэгжүүд (мэдрэмжүүд) нь Фрейм Net-д нэрийн тодорхойлолтуудыг ашигладаг. Бидний фрэйм идентификацийн загвар нь тэдний утгын семантик хоорондоо үндсэн үгийг зориулагдсан үгийг фрэймийн зөв байдлыг үнэлдэг. Бид өөрсдийн загварыг гурван өгөгдлийн багц дээр үнэлгээд энэ нь өмнөх системээс илүү сайн үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Rammeidentifikasjon er ein av nøkkelutfordringane for rammesemantisk tolking. Målet på denne oppgåva er å bestemme kva ramma best tar betydninga til eit målord eller frase i eit setning. Vi presenterer eit nytt modell for ramme- identifikasjon som brukar eit føretrainert transformeringsmodell for å laga representasjonar for ramme og leksiske einingar (sentar) med dei formale definisjonane i rammenett. Bileteidentifiseringsmodellen vårt vurder korleis eit ramme skal passast til eit målord i eit setning basert på semantiske koherens av dei tydingane. Vi evaluerer modellen vårt på tre datasett og viser at det konsistent oppnår bedre utvikling enn tidlegare systemar.', 'so': 'Frame identification is one of the key challenges for frame-semantic parsing.  Ujeedka shaqadaas waa in la caddeeyo qofka ugu wanaagsan uu qabsado hadalka goalka ama erayga uu ku qoro. Tusaale cusub oo loo yaqaan aqoonsiga frame, kaas oo isticmaalaya model isbedelka horumar ah si loo sameeyo noocyo u eg frames iyo isbitaalka leksikal (senses) si loo isticmaalo sawirro rasmi ah oo ku qoran FrameNet. Tusaalada aqoonsiga firaaqadeena ayaa qiimeynaya awoodda uu ku habboon karo hadalka goalka ah oo ku saleysan isku xirka waxyaabaha ay leeyihiin. Tusaalkayaga waxaan ku qiimeynayaa saddexda kooban ee macluumaadka, waxaana tusinaynaa inay si joogto ah u gaadhaa wax ka wanaagsan sameynta nidaamka hore.', 'sv': 'Ramidentifiering är en av de viktigaste utmaningarna för ramsemantisk tolkning. Målet med denna uppgift är att avgöra vilken ram som bäst fångar betydelsen av ett målord eller en målfras i en mening. Vi presenterar en ny modell för ramidentifiering som använder en färdigutbildad transformatormodell för att generera representationer för ramar och lexikala enheter (sinnen) med hjälp av deras formella definitioner i FrameNet. Vår ramidentifieringsmodell bedömer lämpligheten av en ram för ett målord i en mening baserat på semantisk samstämmighet i deras betydelser. Vi utvärderar vår modell på tre datauppsättningar och visar att den konsekvent uppnår bättre prestanda än tidigare system.', 'ta': 'சட்டத்தின் பாடலுக்கான விசையான சவால்களில் ஒன்று. இந்த செயலின் இலக்கு வாக்கியத்தில் எந்த சட்டத்தை சிறப்பாக பிடிக்கும் என்பதை தீர்மானிக்கவும். சட்டத்தின் அடையாளத்திற்கான புதிய மாதிரியை நாம் கொண்டு வருகிறோம். இது முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி மாற்றத்தை பயன்படுத்துகிறது சட்டங்கள் மற எங்கள் சட்டத்தின் அடையாளம் மாதிரி இலக்கு வார்த்தைக்கு தகுதியை மதிப்பிடுகிறது அதன் அர்த்தத்தின் அர்த்தத்தை அடிப்படையில் உள் மூன்று தரவு அமைப்புகளில் எங்கள் மாதிரியை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் முந்தைய கணினிகளை விட மேலும் சிறந்த செயல்பாட்ட', 'si': 'ෆ්\u200dරේම් පරීක්ෂණය තමයි ෆ්\u200dරේම් සෙමැන්ටික් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා යතුරු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් එකක්. මේ වැඩේ ඉලක්කම තමයි වාක්යෙක් වල ඉලක්ක වචනයක් නැත්තම් වචනයක් තියෙන හොඳම ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙන්නේ කො අපි ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා අළුත් මොඩේලයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණය කරපු මොඩේලයක් පාවිච්චි කරන්න ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණය අපේ ෆ්\u200dරේම් පරීක්ෂණ මොඩේල් විශ්වාස කරනවා ඔවුන්ගේ අදහස් සම්බන්ධතාවක් වෙනුවෙන් ඉලක්ෂණ වචනයක් වලට ලක්ෂණ අපි අපේ මොඩල් තුනක් දත්ත සෙට් එකේ අවශ්\u200dය කරන්න පෙන්වන්නේ ඒක පිළිබඳ පද්ධතිය වඩා හොඳ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ල', 'sr': 'Identifikacija okvira je jedan od ključnih izazova za analizu okvira semantičkog analiza. Cilj ovog zadatka je utvrditi koji okvir najbolje hvata značenje ciljne reči ili fraze u rečenici. Predstavljamo novi model za identifikaciju okvira koji koristi predobučeni transformator model kako bi stvorili predstave za okvire i leksičke jedinice (senze) koristeći njihove formalne definicije u FrameNetu. Naš model identifikacije okvira procjenjuje prikladnost okvira za ciljnu reč u rečenici na osnovu semantičke saskašnosti njihovih značenja. Procjenjujemo naš model na tri seta podataka i pokazujemo da to stalno postiže bolju izvršnost od prethodnih sistema.', 'ur': 'فرم شناسایی فرم-semantic پارسینگ کے لئے ایک کلی چالوں میں سے ہے. اس کام کا موقع یہ ہے کہ ایک جماعت میں کون فرم اچھا معنی لیتا ہے؟ ہم فرم شناسایی کے لئے ایک نئی موڈل پیش آموزش کی تغییر موڈل کو استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ فرم اور لکسیکل یونیٹ (سنسوں) کے لئے ان کے فرم کی تعریف کے مطابق فرم نیٹ کے مطابق پیش آموزش کی تغییر موڈل کو ایجاد کریں۔ ہمارے فرم شناسایی موڈل نے ایک فرم کے مطابق مطابق فیصلہ کرتا ہے ایک فیصلہ میں جو ان کے مطابق سیمنٹی تعلق پر بنیاد ہے۔ ہم نے اپنے مدل کو تین ڈیٹ سٹ پر مطابق کرلیا ہے اور دکھا دیتے ہیں کہ یہ اگلے سیستموں سے بہتر کامیابی حاصل کرتا ہے۔', 'vi': 'Nhận diện khung là một trong những thử thách chủ chốt cho việc phân tích khung ngữ. Mục đích của nhiệm vụ này là xác định khung nào nắm bắt ý nghĩa của một từ hay cụm từ đích trong một câu. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình mới để nhận diện khung, dùng một mô hình chuyển đổi được huấn luyện trước để tạo ra các biểu tượng cho các khung và các đơn vị văn bản (cảm xúc) bằng cách dùng định nghĩa chính thức của chúng trong khungNet. Cách xác định khung của chúng tôi đánh giá khả năng của khung cho một từ mục tiêu trong một câu dựa trên sự đồng nghĩa theo ngữ pháp. Chúng tôi đánh giá mẫu của chúng tôi trên ba nhóm dữ liệu và cho thấy nó luôn đạt được hiệu quả tốt hơn những hệ thống trước.', 'uz': "Freymning identifikati - frame- semantik parsing uchun muhim qiymatlar biri. Ushbu vazifa maqsadi, qanday chegara matnni bir so'zda yoki maxsus soʻzni aniqlash. Biz freym identifikatlarining yangi modeli hozir qilamiz, birinchi taʼminlovchi transformer modelini ishlatish uchun freym va leksikal biriklari (sensors) bilan formal aniqlashni ishlatish mumkin. Freymning qiymati modeli chegarasining chegarasining qiymatini tasavvur qiladi. Biz uch maʼlumotlar tarkibida modelimizni qiymatimiz va bu birinchi tizimdan yaxshi bajarishini ko'rsatdik.", 'bg': 'Идентификацията на рамката е едно от ключовите предизвикателства за рамково-семантичното анализиране. Целта на тази задача е да се определи коя рамка най-добре улавя значението на целева дума или фраза в изречение. Представяме нов модел за идентификация на рамки, който използва предварително обучен трансформаторен модел за генериране на изображения за рамки и лексикални единици (сетива), използвайки техните формални дефиниции в FrameNet. Нашият модел за идентификация на рамката оценява пригодността на рамката за целева дума в изречение въз основа на семантичната съгласуваност на значенията им. Ние оценяваме нашия модел на три набора от данни и показваме, че той постоянно постига по-добра производителност от предишните системи.', 'da': 'Rammeidentifikation er en af de vigtigste udfordringer for rammesemantisk parsing. Målet med denne opgave er at bestemme, hvilken ramme der bedst fanger betydningen af et målord eller sætning i en sætning. Vi præsenterer en ny model til rammeidentifikation, der bruger en forududdannet transformermodel til at generere repræsentationer for rammer og lexikale enheder (sanser) ved hjælp af deres formelle definitioner i FrameNet. Vores rammeidentifikationsmodel vurderer en rammes egnethed til et målord i en sætning baseret på den semantiske sammenhæng af deres betydninger. Vi evaluerer vores model på tre datasæt og viser, at den konsekvent opnår bedre ydeevne end tidligere systemer.', 'nl': 'Frame identificatie is een van de belangrijkste uitdagingen voor frame-semantische parsing. Het doel van deze taak is om te bepalen welk frame het beste de betekenis van een doelwoord of -zin in een zin weergeeft. We presenteren een nieuw model voor frame identificatie dat gebruikmaakt van een vooraf getraind transformator model om representaties te genereren voor frames en lexicale eenheden (zintuigen) met behulp van hun formele definities in FrameNet. Ons frame identificatiemodel beoordeelt de geschiktheid van een frame voor een doelwoord in een zin op basis van de semantische samenhang van hun betekenissen. We evalueren ons model op drie datasets en laten zien dat het consistent betere prestaties levert dan eerdere systemen.', 'ko': '프레임 식별은 프레임 의미 분석의 관건적인 도전 중의 하나이다.이 임무의 목표는 문장에서 목표어나 단어의 의미를 가장 잘 포착할 수 있는 프레임을 정하는 것이다.우리는 새로운 프레임워크 식별 모델을 제시했다. 이 모델은 미리 훈련된 변환기 모델을 사용하고 프레임워크 네트워크의 형식화된 정의를 이용하여 프레임워크와 어휘 단원(감각관)의 표시를 생성한다.우리의 프레임 식별 모델은 문장에서 목표어의 의미 일관성에 따라 프레임이 목표어에 대한 적용성을 평가한다.우리는 세 개의 데이터 집합에서 우리의 모델을 평가했고, 그것은 시종 이전의 시스템보다 더 좋은 성능을 얻었다는 것을 나타냈다.', 'hr': 'Identifikacija okvira je jedna od ključnih izazova za razmatranje okvira semantičkog analiza. Cilj ovog zadatka je utvrditi koji okvir najbolje hvata značenje ciljne riječi ili fraze u rečenici. Predstavljamo novi model za identifikaciju okvira koji koristi predobučeni transformator model kako bi stvorili predstave za okvire i leksičke jedinice (čula) koristeći njihove formalne definicije u FrameNetu. Naš model identifikacije okvira procjenjuje odgovarajućnost okvira za ciljnu riječ u rečenici na temelju semantičke konsekvencije njihovih značenja. Procjenjujemo naš model na tri kompleta podataka i pokazujemo da to stalno postiže bolji učinkovit od prethodnih sustava.', 'de': 'Frame-Identifikation ist eine der wichtigsten Herausforderungen für Frame-Semantic Parsing. Ziel dieser Aufgabe ist es zu bestimmen, welcher Rahmen die Bedeutung eines Zielworts oder Phrases in einem Satz am besten erfasst. Wir präsentieren ein neues Modell zur Frameidentifikation, das mithilfe eines vortrainierten Transformatormodells Darstellungen für Frames und lexikalische Einheiten (Sinne) mithilfe ihrer formalen Definitionen in FrameNet generiert. Unser Rahmenidentifikationsmodell bewertet die Eignung eines Rahmens für ein Zielwort in einem Satz anhand der semantischen Kohärenz ihrer Bedeutungen. Wir evaluieren unser Modell anhand von drei Datensätzen und zeigen, dass es durchweg bessere Performance als bisherige Systeme erzielt.', 'fa': 'شناسایی چهره یکی از چالش\u200cهای کلیدی برای بررسی چهره\u200cهای semantic است. هدف این کار این است که تعیین کنید که کدام فرم بهترین معنی یک کلمه هدف یا عبارت را در یک جمله می گیرد. ما مدل جدید برای شناسایی فرم را پیش آموزش می\u200cدهیم که از مدل تغییر\u200cدهنده پیش آموزش استفاده می\u200cکند تا نمایش\u200cدهندگان برای فرم\u200cها و واحد\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی (احساسات) را با استفاده از تعریف\u200cهای رسمی\u200cشان در FrameNet تولی مدل شناسایی قالب ما مناسب یک قالب برای یک کلمه هدف را در یک جمله بر اساس تعلق سیمانی معنی\u200cهایشان ارزیابی می\u200cکند. ما مدل خود را بر سه مجموعه اطلاعات ارزیابی می کنیم و نشان می دهیم که به طور کامل عملکرد بهتر از سیستم های قبلی رسیده است.', 'id': 'Frame identification is one of the key challenges for frame-semantic parsing.  Tujuan tugas ini adalah untuk menentukan bingkai mana yang terbaik menangkap arti kata atau frasa target dalam kalimat. Kami mempersembahkan model baru untuk identifikasi bingkai yang menggunakan model transformer yang dilatih-dilatih untuk menghasilkan representation untuk bingkai dan unit lexik (senses) menggunakan definisi formal mereka di FrameNet. Model identifikasi bingkai kami menilai kemampuan bingkai untuk kata sasaran dalam kalimat berdasarkan konsistensi semantis dari arti mereka. Kami mengevaluasi model kami pada tiga set data dan menunjukkan bahwa secara konsisten mencapai prestasi yang lebih baik dari sistem sebelumnya.', 'sw': 'Utambulisho wa mfumo ni moja ya changamoto muhimu za kujenga wimbo wa sekunde. Lengo la juhudi hili ni kuamua ni nani mfumo mzuri unaoonesha maana ya neno la lengo au msemo katika hukumu. Tunaweka mfano mpya kwa utambulisho wa mfumo unaotumia modeli ya mabadiliko ya awali kwa ajili ya kutengeneza maonesho kwa ajili ya viungo na vifaa vya lexico kwa kutumia maelezo rasmi katika mtandao wa FrameNet. Mfano wetu wa utambulisho wa mfumo unapitia uwezekano wa mfumo wa neno la lengo katika sentensi kwa msingi wa ushirikiano wa maana yao. Tutathmini mtindo wetu kwenye seti za takwimu tatu na kuonyesha kwamba kwa kawaida utafanikiwa ufanisi bora kuliko mifumo iliyopita.', 'tr': 'frame-semantik ayırmak üçin aç kynçylyklardan biri. Bu zadyň maksady - sözlemde maksadyň sözüniň nähili frame adyny alandygyny belli etmekdir. Bir çerçive tanımlaması için yeni bir modeli gösteriyoruz ki, ön eğitimli bir çerçive modeli çerçive ve leksi birimleri (sensler) formal tanımlamalarını kullanarak ön eğitimli bir şekilde kullanır. Biziň çerýän identifikaçy nusgasymyz sözleriň semantik anlamlyklarynyň bir maksady sözleriň ýerligini takyklaýar. Biziň modelimizi üç sany maglumatlarda deňleýäris we munyň öňki sistemalardan has gowy hereket edip bilýändigini görkezýäris.', 'sq': 'Identifikimi i kuadrit është një nga sfidat kryesore për analizimin kuadri-semantik. Qëllimi i kësaj detyre është të përcaktohet cili kornizë përfshin më së miri kuptimin e një fjale apo fraze objektive në një fjalë. Ne paraqesim një model të ri për identifikimin e kuadrit që përdor një model transformues të trajnuar para për të gjeneruar përfaqësime për kuadrit dhe njësitë lexike (ndjenja) duke përdorur përkufizimet e tyre zyrtare në FrameNet. Modeli ynë i identifikimit të kuadrit vlerëson përshtatjen e një kuadri për një fjalë objektive në një fjalë bazuar në konsistencën semantike të kuptimeve të tyre. Ne vlerësojmë modelin tonë në tre grupe të dhënash dhe tregojmë se ai arrin vazhdimisht performancë më të mirë se sistemet e mëparshëm.', 'am': 'የframe-semantic ማኅበረሰብ ከቁልፎች ውጤቶች አንዱ ነው፡፡ የዚህ ስራ አቀላቅሎ መሆኑን መክፈት የሚሻለውን የቦታ ቃላት ወይም ቃላት በክፍል የሚያስፈልገውን ማረጋገጥ ነው፡፡ የፍሬም ማውቀት አዲስ ምሳሌ እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ የፍሬም ማውቀታችን ምሳሌ የፍሬም ቃላት የሚስፈልገውን በአካሄዳቸው የስሜት ግንኙነት በተመሳሳይ ቃል መግለጫ ያስባል፡፡ በሦስት ዳታዎች ላይ ሞዴልናችንን እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'az': "Çerçive tanımlaması çerçive-semantik ayırılması üçün açar çətinliklərdən biridir. Bu işin məqsədi məqsədilə sözlərdə məqsədil sözlərin və sözlərin anlamını daha yaxşı çəkdiyini belə çəkməkdir. Biz FrameNet'də formal tanımlamalarını istifadə etmək üçün öyrənmiş transformer modelini istifadə edən yeni bir modeli göstəririk. Çerçive kimlikləri modeli, onların anlamının semantik müvafiqliyinə dayanan bir sözlərdə məqsəd sözlərinin uyğunluğunu təsdiq edir. Biz modelimizi üç verilən qurğularda değerləşdiririk və göstəririk ki, bu, əvvəlki sistemlərdən daha yaxşı performans yetirir.", 'af': "Raam identifikasie is een van die sleutel uitdrukkings vir raam-semantiese verwerking. Die doel van hierdie taak is om te bepaal watter raam beste opneem die betekening van 'n doelwoord of frase in' n seting. Ons voorsien 'n nuwe model vir raam identifikasie wat gebruik 'n voorafgevorderde transformeermodel om voorstellings vir rame en leksiese eenhede (senses) te genereer deur hul formeel definisies in FrameNet te gebruik. Ons raam identifikasie model bepaal die geskikte van 'n raam vir' n doelwoord in' n seting gebaseer op die semantiese koherens van hulle betekening. Ons evalueer ons model op drie data stelle en wys dat dit konsistentlik beter prestasie bereik as vorige stelsels.", 'hy': 'Քաղաքարի հայտնաբերումը շրջանակի սեմանտիկ վերլուծության հիմնական մարտահրավերներից մեկն է: Այս խնդիրը նպատակն է որոշել, թե որն է լավագույնը ընդունում նպատակային բառի կամ արտահայտության իմաստը նախադասության մեջ: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի նոր մոդել շրջանակի հայտնաբերման համար, որը օգտագործում է նախապատրաստված վերափոխողի մոդել, որպեսզի ստեղծի շրջանակների և լեքսիկական միավորների ներկայացումներ, օգտագործելով նրանց պաշտոնական սահմանումները Մեր շրջանակի հայտնաբերման մոդելը գնահատում է շրջանակի համապատասխանությունը նպատակային բառի համար նախադասության մեջ, հիմնված նրանց իմաստների սեմանտիկ համապատասխանության վրա: Մենք գնահատում ենք մեր մոդելը երեք տվյալների համակարգերի վրա և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այն մշտապես ավելի լավ արդյունք է ստանում, քան նախորդ համակարգերը:', 'bs': 'Identifikacija okvira je jedan od ključnih izazova za analizu okvira semantičkog analiza. Cilj ovog zadatka je utvrditi koji okvir najbolje hvata značenje ciljne riječi ili fraze u rečenici. Predstavljamo novi model za identifikaciju okvira koji koristi predobučeni transformator model kako bi stvorili predstave za okvire i leksičke jedinice (čula) koristeći njihove formalne definicije u FrameNetu. Naš model identifikacije okvira procjenjuje odgovarajućnost okvira za ciljnu riječ u rečenici na temelju semantičke konsekvence njihovih značenja. Procjenjujemo naš model na tri seta podataka i pokazujemo da to stalno postiže bolju izvršnost od prethodnih sustava.', 'bn': 'ফ্রেম-সেম্যান্টিক পার্জিং এর প্রধান চ্যালেঞ্জের একটি। এই কাজের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে কোন ফ্রেমের মধ্যে শ্রেষ্ঠ কোন লক্ষ্য শব্দ বা শব্দের অর্থ নির্ধারণ করা যায়। আমরা ফ্রেম পরিচয়ের জন্য একটি নতুন মডেল উপস্থাপন করি যা পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত পরিবর্তন মডেল ব্যবহার করে ফ্রেম এবং লেক্সিক্যাল ইউনিট (সেন্স) ব্যবহার করে তাদের আনু আমাদের ফ্রেম পরিচিতি মডেল তাদের অর্থের সেম্পেন্টিক সমতুল্যের ভিত্তিতে একটি গোয়েন্দা শব্দের জন্য একটি ফ্রেমের সুযোগের আমরা তিনটি ডাটা সেটে আমাদের মডেল মূল্যায়ন করি এবং দেখাই যে এটা পূর্ববর্তী সিস্টেমের চেয়ে ভালো কাজ অর্জন করে।', 'cs': 'Identifikace rámců je jednou z klíčových výzev pro sémantickou analýzu rámců. Cílem tohoto úkolu je určit, který rámeček nejlépe zachycuje význam cílového slova nebo fráze ve větě. Představujeme nový model pro identifikaci rámců, který využívá předem trénovaný transformátorový model k generování reprezentací rámců a lexikálních jednotek (smyslů) pomocí jejich formálních definicí v FrameNet. Náš model identifikace rámců hodnotí vhodnost rámce pro cílové slovo ve větě na základě sémantické koherence jejich významů. Vyhodnocujeme náš model na třech datových sadách a ukazujeme, že důsledně dosahuje lepšího výkonu než předchozí systémy.', 'ca': "L'identificació del marc és un dels reptes clau per l'analització semàntica del marc. L'objectiu d'aquesta tasca és determinar quin marc captura millor el significat d'una paraula o frase alvo en una frase. Presentam un nou model d'identificació de cadres que utilitza un model de transformador pré-entrenat per generar representacions per cadres i unitats lexiques (sentits) utilitzant les seves definicions oficials a FrameNet. El nostre model d'identificació de marcs evalua l'adequació d'un marc per a una paraula alvo en una frase basada en la coherencia semàntica dels seus significats. We evaluate our model on three data sets and show that it consistently achieves better performance than previous systems.", 'et': 'Raami identifitseerimine on raamsemantilise parsimise üks peamisi väljakutseid. Selle ülesande eesmärk on kindlaks määrata, milline raam tabab kõige paremini lause sihtsõna või fraasi tähenduse. Esitleme uue raamide identifitseerimise mudeli, mis kasutab eelnevalt väljaõpetatud transformaatori mudelit raamide ja leksikaalsete üksuste (meelte) esituste genereerimiseks, kasutades nende formaalseid definitsioone FrameNetis. Meie raami identifitseerimise mudel hindab raami sobivust lause sihtsõna jaoks, lähtudes nende tähenduste semantilisest sidususest. Hindame oma mudelit kolme andmekogumi põhjal ja näitame, et see saavutab pidevalt parema jõudluse kui varasemad süsteemid.', 'fi': 'Kehysten tunnistus on yksi kehyssentiikan jäsentämisen keskeisistä haasteista. Tämän tehtävän tavoitteena on selvittää, mikä kehys parhaiten tallentaa kohdesanan tai lauseen merkityksen lauseessa. Esittelemme uuden kehyksen tunnistusmallin, joka käyttää esikoulutettua muuntajamallia kehysten ja leksikaalisten yksiköiden (aistien) representaatioiden tuottamiseen käyttäen niiden virallisia määritelmiä FrameNetissä. Kehyksen tunnistusmallimme arvioi kehyksen soveltuvuutta lauseen kohdesanalle niiden merkitysten semanttisen koherenssin perusteella. Arvioimme mallia kolmen datajoukon perusteella ja osoitamme, että se saavuttaa johdonmukaisesti paremman suorituskyvyn kuin aikaisemmat järjestelmät.', 'ha': "Shaidar firam yana daga cikin masu ƙauwãyar kima wa parse-semantic firam. Yagon wannan aikin ne dõmin ka ƙayyade wanne firam mafi kyau zai riƙe ma'anar maganar wata maganar da aka yi amfani da shi cikin birane. Tuna gabatar da wani motsi na ganin firam wanda ke amfani da wata motel mai shige ta gabã ɗaya dõmin ya ƙãga tsari wa firam da yeke kifi (sans) don ya yi amfani da fassararsu masu motsi na takarda cikin FrameNet. Shirin shaidar firam na ƙaddara muhimmin firam wa maganar da aka yi amfani da shi cikin maganar, a kan salon da ke daidaita koshi na fassararsa. Kana ƙaddara misalinmu a kan daidaita taki uku kuma mu nuna cewa yana da mafiya alhẽri ga performance ko da na'urar farko.", 'jv': 'frame-semanti goal Where am I nambah nambah Awak dhéwé éntuk model dhéwé kanggo telu operasi dadi lan ngono kuwi bisa nguasai njaluk sing luwih apik sing luwih apik sing sistem sing sabanjuré.', 'sk': 'Identifikacija okvirjev je eden ključnih izzivov za semantično razčlenjevanje okvirjev. Cilj te naloge je ugotoviti, kateri okvir najbolje zajame pomen ciljne besede ali fraze v stavku. Predstavljamo nov model identifikacije okvirjev, ki uporablja vnaprej usposobljen transformatorski model za ustvarjanje reprezentacij okvirjev in leksikalnih enot (čutov) z uporabo njihovih formalnih definicij v FrameNetu. Naš model identifikacije okvirjev ocenjuje primernost okvirja za ciljno besedo v stavku na podlagi semantične koherence njihovih pomenov. Naš model ocenjujemo na treh naborih podatkov in dokazujemo, da dosledno dosega boljšo zmogljivost kot prejšnji sistemi.', 'bo': 'Frame identification is one of the key challenges for frame-semantic parsing. བྱ་འགུལ་འདིའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ཚིག་སྒྲོམ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཚིག་དང་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་ཚིག་ཚན་དམིགས We present a new model for frame identification that uses a pre-trained transformer model to generate representations for frames and lexical units (senses) using their formal definitions in FrameNet. ང་ཚོའི་གཞུང་ཚང་འཛིན་གྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཚིག་ཅིག་ནང་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་མཐུན་རྟགས་དེ་འདྲ་ཞིག་བྱེད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་གསུམ་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལྟར་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱང་། དེ་ནི་སྔོན་གྱི་མ་ལག་ལས་རྐྱེན་ས', 'he': 'זיהוי המפלגה הוא אחד האתגרים המרכזים עבור בדיקת המפלגה סמנטית. המטרה של המשימה הזו היא לקבוע איזה מסגר הכי טוב לתפוס את המשמעות של מילה מטרה או ביטוי במשפט. אנחנו מציגים מודל חדש לזהות מסגרת שמשתמש מודל משתנה מאומן מראש לייצר מייצגים עבור מסגרות ויחידות לקסיות (חושים) בשימוש ההגדרות הרשמיות שלהם ב FrameNet. Our frame identification model assesses the suitability of a frame for a target word in a sentence based on the semantic coherence of their meanings.  אנו מעריכים את המודל שלנו על שלושה קבוצות נתונים ולהראות שהוא משיג ביצועים טובים יותר ממערכות קודמות.'}
{'en': 'ADePT : Auto-encoder based Differentially Private Text Transformation', 'fr': 'ADept\xa0: Transformation de texte différentielle privée basée sur un encodeur automatique', 'pt': 'ADePT: Transformação de Texto Privado Diferencialmente Baseado em Codificador Automático', 'ar': 'ADePT: تحويل النص الخاص التفاضلي القائم على التشفير التلقائي', 'es': 'ADept: transformación de texto diferencialmente privada basada en el codificador automático', 'ja': 'ADePT ：オートエンコーダベースの差分プライベートテキスト変換', 'zh': 'ADePT:编码器差私文本', 'hi': 'ADePT: स्वत: एन्कोडर आधारित Differentially निजी पाठ रूपांतरण', 'ru': 'ADePT: Дифференциальное преобразование личного текста на основе автокодирования', 'ga': 'ADePT: Uath-ionchódóir bunaithe ar Chlaochlú Téacs Difreálach Príobháideach', 'el': 'ADEPT: Μεταμόρφωση διαφορετικά ιδιωτικού κειμένου με βάση τον αυτόματο κωδικοποιητή', 'hu': 'ADEPT: Automatikus kódoló alapú, differenciálisan privát szövegtranszformáció', 'ka': 'ADePT: ავტოკოდერების განსხვავებული პირადი ტექსტის რტრანფორმაცია', 'kk': 'ADePT: Авто- кодтамасы негіздеген әртүрлі жеке мәтін түрлендіру', 'lt': 'ADePT: Autokodavimo sistema, pagrįsta skirtingai privačiu tekstu', 'mk': 'АДЕПТ: Автоматски кодирач базиран на различно приватен текст трансформација', 'ms': 'ADePT: Transformasi Teks Pribadi Berdasarkan Pengekod-Auto', 'ml': 'എഡിപിടി: സ്വയം കോഡെര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ വ്യത്യസ്തമായി വെളിപ്പെട്ട പദാവലി മാറ്റുന്നത്', 'it': 'ADEPT: Trasformazione del testo differentemente privata basata su encoder automatico', 'mt': 'ADePT: Trasformazzjoni tat-Test Differenzjalment Privat ibbażata fuq l-awto-kodifikatur', 'mn': 'ADePT: Авто-кодлогчийн үндсэн өөр хувийн текст шилжүүлэлт', 'sr': 'ADePT: Autokoder baziran na različitim privatnim transformacijama teksta', 'no': 'ADePT: Automatisk koding basert forskjellig privat teksttransformering', 'si': 'ADePT: ස්වයංකේතය- කෝඩාර් අධාරිත වෙනස් පෞද්ගලික පාළුම වෙනස්ථානය', 'pl': 'ADEPT: automatyczna transformacja tekstu różnicowo prywatnego oparta na koderze', 'so': 'ADePT: Auto-encoder based Differentially Private Text Transformation', 'ro': 'ADEPT: Transformarea textului diferențial privat bazată pe codare automată', 'ta': 'ADePT: தனிப்பட்ட உரை மாற்றம்', 'ur': 'ADePT: اٹو- اکنوڈر بنیادی مختلف خصوصی تغییرات', 'sv': 'ADEPT: Automatisk kodningsbaserad differentialt privat textomvandling', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Chương trình biến đổi văn bản riêng', 'bg': 'ADEPT: Автоматично кодиране базирано на диференциално частно преобразуване на текст', 'da': 'ADEPT: Auto-encoder baseret differentielt privat teksttransformation', 'nl': 'ADEPT: Auto-encoder gebaseerde differentieel private teksttransformatie', 'hr': 'ADePT: Automatski koder baziran na različitim privatnim transformacijama teksta', 'de': 'ADEPT: Auto-Encoder basierte Differential Private Text Transformation', 'id': 'ADePT: Transformasi Teks Pribadi Berdasarkan Pengenkodasi Otomatis', 'ko': 'AdePT: 자동 인코더에 의한 차이점 개인 텍스트 변환', 'fa': 'ADePT: تغییرات متن خصوصی متفاوت بر اساس رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cی خودکار', 'sw': 'ADePT: Ujumbe wa maandishi binafsi', 'tr': 'ADePT: Otomatik ködleme', 'af': 'ADePT: Outo- enkoder gebaseer Verskillende Private Teks Transformasie', 'sq': 'ADePT: Transformimi i Tekstit Privat me bazë automatike', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'ADeP: Auto-Encder', 'az': 'ADePT: Avtomatik kodlay캼c캼, D톛rf톛likl톛 칐z M톛tn Transformasiyas캼', 'bn': 'ADePT: স্বয়ংক্রিয় কোডার ভিত্তিক ভিন্ন ভিত্তিক প্রাইভেট টেক্সট পরিবর্তন', 'cs': 'ADEPT: Automatický kodér založený na diferenciálně soukromém textu transformace', 'ca': "ADePT: Transformació de text diferencialment privat basada en l'autocodificador", 'et': 'ADEPT: automaatse kodeerija põhinev diferentsiaalselt privaatne teksti teisendamine', 'bs': 'ADePT: Autokoder baziran na različitim privatnim transformacijama teksta', 'fi': 'ADEPT: Automaattinen koodauspohjainen differentially Private Text Transformation', 'jv': 'NAME OF TRANSLATORS', 'sk': 'ADEPT: Samodejno kodiranje, ki temelji na diferencialno zasebni transformaciji besedila', 'bo': 'ADePT: རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཨ་རྟགས་ཀྱིས་ཁྱད་པར་ཁྱད་པར་མི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཡི་གེའི་བཟོ་བཅོས', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'ADePT: שינוי טקסט פרטי מבוסס באוטומטי'}
{'en': 'Privacy is an important concern when building statistical models on data containing personal information. Differential privacy offers a strong definition of privacy and can be used to solve several privacy concerns. Multiple solutions have been proposed for the differentially-private transformation of datasets containing sensitive information. However, such transformation algorithms offer poor utility in Natural Language Processing (NLP) tasks due to noise added in the process. This paper addresses this issue by providing a utility-preserving differentially private text transformation algorithm using auto-encoders. Our algorithm transforms text to offer robustness against attacks and produces transformations with high semantic quality that perform well on downstream NLP tasks. We prove our algorithm’s theoretical privacy guarantee and assess its privacy leakage under Membership Inference Attacks (MIA) on models trained with transformed data. Our results show that the proposed model performs better against MIA attacks while offering lower to no degradation in the utility of the underlying transformation process compared to existing baselines.', 'ar': 'الخصوصية هي مصدر قلق مهم عند بناء نماذج إحصائية على البيانات التي تحتوي على معلومات شخصية. تقدم الخصوصية التفاضلية تعريفًا قويًا للخصوصية ويمكن استخدامها لحل العديد من مشكلات الخصوصية. تم اقتراح حلول متعددة للتحويل التفاضلي الخاص لمجموعات البيانات التي تحتوي على معلومات حساسة. ومع ذلك ، فإن خوارزميات التحويل هذه تقدم فائدة ضعيفة في مهام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية (NLP) بسبب الضوضاء المضافة في العملية. تتناول هذه الورقة هذه المشكلة من خلال توفير خوارزمية تحويل النص الخاص التفاضلي للمحافظة على الأداة المساعدة باستخدام التشفير التلقائي. تقوم الخوارزمية الخاصة بنا بتحويل النص لتقديم قوة ضد الهجمات وتنتج تحويلات بجودة دلالية عالية تؤدي أداءً جيدًا في مهام معالجة اللغات الطبيعية. لقد أثبتنا ضمان الخصوصية النظري للخوارزمية الخاصة بنا ونقيّم تسرب خصوصيته في إطار هجمات استدلال العضوية (MIA) على النماذج المدربة على البيانات المحولة. تظهر نتائجنا أن النموذج المقترح يعمل بشكل أفضل ضد هجمات MIA بينما يقدم تدهورًا أقل أو معدومًا في فائدة عملية التحويل الأساسية مقارنة بخطوط الأساس الحالية.', 'fr': "La confidentialité est une préoccupation importante lors de l'élaboration de modèles statistiques à partir de données contenant des informations personnelles. La confidentialité différentielle offre une définition précise de la confidentialité et peut être utilisée pour résoudre plusieurs problèmes de confidentialité. De multiples solutions ont été proposées pour la transformation différentielle privée d'ensembles de données contenant des informations sensibles. Cependant, de tels algorithmes de transformation ne sont pas très utiles dans les tâches de traitement du langage naturel (NLP) en raison du bruit ajouté dans le processus. Cet article aborde ce problème en fournissant un algorithme de transformation de texte privé différentielle préservant l'utilitaire à l'aide d'encodeurs automatiques. Notre algorithme transforme le texte pour offrir de la robustesse face aux attaques et produit des transformations de haute qualité sémantique qui fonctionnent bien sur les tâches de PNL en aval. Nous prouvons la garantie théorique de confidentialité de notre algorithme et évaluons sa fuite de confidentialité dans le cadre d'attaques par inférence d'appartenance (MIA) sur des modèles formés avec des données transformées. Nos résultats montrent que le modèle proposé est plus performant contre les attaques MIA tout en offrant une dégradation faible ou nulle de l'utilité du processus de transformation sous-jacent par rapport aux lignes de base existantes.", 'pt': 'A privacidade é uma preocupação importante ao construir modelos estatísticos sobre dados que contêm informações pessoais. A privacidade diferencial oferece uma forte definição de privacidade e pode ser usada para resolver várias questões de privacidade. Várias soluções foram propostas para a transformação diferencialmente privada de conjuntos de dados contendo informações confidenciais. No entanto, tais algoritmos de transformação oferecem pouca utilidade em tarefas de processamento de linguagem natural (NLP) devido ao ruído adicionado no processo. Este artigo aborda esse problema fornecendo um algoritmo de transformação de texto diferencialmente privado que preserva o utilitário usando codificadores automáticos. Nosso algoritmo transforma texto para oferecer robustez contra ataques e produz transformações com alta qualidade semântica com bom desempenho em tarefas de NLP downstream. Provamos a garantia de privacidade teórica do nosso algoritmo e avaliamos seu vazamento de privacidade sob ataques de inferência de membros (MIA) em modelos treinados com dados transformados. Nossos resultados mostram que o modelo proposto funciona melhor contra ataques MIA, oferecendo menor ou nenhuma degradação na utilidade do processo de transformação subjacente em comparação com as linhas de base existentes.', 'es': 'La privacidad es una preocupación importante a la hora de crear modelos estadísticos sobre datos que contienen información personal. La privacidad diferencial ofrece una definición sólida de privacidad y se puede utilizar para resolver varios problemas de privacidad. Se han propuesto múltiples soluciones para la transformación diferencialmente privada de conjuntos de datos que contienen información confidencial. Sin embargo, estos algoritmos de transformación ofrecen una utilidad deficiente en las tareas de procesamiento del lenguaje natural (NLP) debido al ruido agregado en el proceso. Este documento aborda este problema al proporcionar un algoritmo de transformación de texto diferencialmente privado que preserva la utilidad mediante codificadores automáticos. Nuestro algoritmo transforma el texto para ofrecer robustez contra los ataques y produce transformaciones con alta calidad semántica que funcionan bien en las tareas posteriores de la PNL. Demostramos la garantía de privacidad teórica de nuestro algoritmo y evaluamos su fuga de privacidad bajo los ataques de inferencia de membresía (MIA) en modelos entrenados con datos transformados. Nuestros resultados muestran que el modelo propuesto funciona mejor contra los ataques de MIA, al tiempo que ofrece una degradación menor o nula en la utilidad del proceso de transformación subyacente en comparación con las líneas de base existentes.', 'ja': 'プライバシーは、個人情報を含むデータに統計モデルを構築する際に重要な懸念事項です。 差別化されたプライバシーは、プライバシーの強力な定義を提供し、いくつかのプライバシーの懸念を解決するために使用することができます。 機密情報を含むデータセットの差分プライベート変換には、複数のソリューションが提案されています。 しかしながら、そのような変換アルゴリズムは、プロセスで追加されたノイズのために、自然言語処理（ ＮＬＰ ）タスクにおける貧弱な有用性を提供する。 本稿では、オートエンコーダを用いた差分保存型のプライベートテキスト変換アルゴリズムを提供することで、この問題に対処する。 当社のアルゴリズムは、テキストを変換して攻撃に対する堅牢性を提供し、ダウンストリームNLPタスクで優れたパフォーマンスを発揮する高セマンティック品質の変換を生成します。 私たちは、アルゴリズムの理論的なプライバシー保証を証明し、変換されたデータでトレーニングされたモデルのメンバーシップ推論攻撃（ MIA ）の下でプライバシー漏洩を評価します。 我々の結果は、提案されたモデルが、既存のベースラインと比較して、基礎となる変換プロセスの有用性において低い劣化を提供しながら、MIA攻撃に対してより優れたパフォーマンスを発揮することを示しています。', 'zh': '凡包个人信息之数,计模形之时,隐者,大也。 差分隐私为隐私给了强力的定义,可以决定几个隐私。 其包含敏感信息之数,私有转移,已多解决方案。 然益噪声于此,转算于自然语言(NLP)其效甚劣。 本文因用自编码器供一种留效用的差分私有文本转换算法来决定这件事。 吾算法转文以供攻击之鲁棒性,而成高语义之量,NLP于下流。 算法阴私,推理攻击(MIA)下对用转数训练的模型评其隐私泄漏。 吾之的结果表明,比于今基线,则形于抗MIA攻则愈,而于基转之效则愈下者至无降级。', 'ru': 'Конфиденциальность является важной проблемой при построении статистических моделей на основе данных, содержащих личную информацию. Дифференциальная конфиденциальность дает четкое определение конфиденциальности и может быть использована для решения нескольких проблем конфиденциальности. Для дифференциально-частного преобразования наборов данных, содержащих конфиденциальную информацию, было предложено несколько решений. Однако, такие алгоритмы преобразования предлагают плохую полезность в задачах Обработки Естественного Языка (NLP) из-за шума добавленного в процесс. В данной работе данная проблема решается путем предоставления алгоритма дифференцированного преобразования текста с сохранением утилиты с использованием автокодировщиков. Наш алгоритм преобразует текст, чтобы обеспечить устойчивость к атакам, и производит преобразования с высоким семантическим качеством, которые хорошо справляются с последующими задачами NLP. Мы доказываем теоретическую гарантию конфиденциальности нашего алгоритма и оцениваем утечку конфиденциальности в рамках Атаки на основе членства (MIA) на моделях, обученных с преобразованными данными. Наши результаты показывают, что предлагаемая модель лучше защищает от атак MIA, в то же время предлагая более низкую или нулевую деградацию полезности лежащего в основе процесса трансформации по сравнению с существующими базовыми линиями.', 'hi': 'व्यक्तिगत जानकारी वाले डेटा पर सांख्यिकीय मॉडल का निर्माण करते समय गोपनीयता एक महत्वपूर्ण चिंता का विषय है। विभेदक गोपनीयता गोपनीयता की एक मजबूत परिभाषा प्रदान करती है और इसका उपयोग कई गोपनीयता चिंताओं को हल करने के लिए किया जा सकता है। संवेदनशील जानकारी वाले डेटासेट के विभेदक-निजी परिवर्तन के लिए कई समाधान प्रस्तावित किए गए हैं। हालांकि, इस तरह के परिवर्तन एल्गोरिदम प्रक्रिया में जोड़े गए शोर के कारण प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण (एनएलपी) कार्यों में खराब उपयोगिता प्रदान करते हैं। यह पेपर ऑटो-एनकोडर का उपयोग करके एक उपयोगिता-संरक्षण विभेदक रूप से निजी पाठ रूपांतरण एल्गोरिथ्म प्रदान करके इस समस्या को संबोधित करता है। हमारा एल्गोरिथ्म हमलों के खिलाफ मजबूती प्रदान करने के लिए पाठ को बदल देता है और उच्च शब्दार्थ गुणवत्ता के साथ परिवर्तनों का उत्पादन करता है जो डाउनस्ट्रीम एनएलपी कार्यों पर अच्छी तरह से प्रदर्शन करते हैं। हम अपने एल्गोरिथ्म की सैद्धांतिक गोपनीयता गारंटी साबित करते हैं और परिवर्तित डेटा के साथ प्रशिक्षित मॉडल पर सदस्यता अनुमान हमलों (एमआईए) के तहत इसकी गोपनीयता रिसाव का आकलन करते हैं। हमारे परिणामों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित मॉडल एमआईए हमलों के खिलाफ बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है, जबकि मौजूदा बेसलाइन की तुलना में अंतर्निहित परिवर्तन प्रक्रिया की उपयोगिता में कोई गिरावट नहीं है।', 'ga': 'Is ábhar imní tábhachtach é príobháideacht agus samhlacha staitistiúla á dtógáil ar shonraí ina bhfuil faisnéis phearsanta. Tugann príobháideacht dhifreálach sainmhíniú láidir ar phríobháideachas agus is féidir é a úsáid chun roinnt imní príobháideachta a réiteach. Moladh réitigh iolracha chun tacair shonraí ina bhfuil faisnéis íogair a chlaochlú go difreálach-phríobháideach. Mar sin féin, cuireann algartaim claochlaithe den sórt sin droch-áisiúlacht ar fáil i dtascanna Próiseála Teanga Nádúrtha (NLP) de bharr torainn a chuirtear leis an bpróiseas. Tugann an páipéar seo aghaidh ar an tsaincheist seo trí algartam trasfhoirmithe téacs príobháideach a chaomhnaíonn fóntais a sholáthar agus úsáid á baint as uath-ionchódóirí. Athraíonn ár n-algartam téacs chun stóinseacht in aghaidh ionsaithe a thairiscint agus cruthaíonn sé claochluithe le hardchaighdeán shéimeantach a fheidhmíonn go maith ar thascanna NLP iartheachtacha. Cruthaímid ráthaíocht theoiriciúil príobháideachta ár n-algartam agus déanaimid measúnú ar a sceitheadh príobháideachta faoi Ionsaithe Tátail Ballraíochta (MIA) ar mhúnlaí atá oilte le sonraí claochlaithe. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí go bhfeidhmíonn an tsamhail atá beartaithe níos fearr i gcoinne ionsaithe MIA agus ag an am céanna ag tairiscint níos ísle gan aon díghrádú ar áirgiúlacht an phróisis bunathraithe i gcomparáid leis na bunlínte atá ann cheana féin.', 'hu': 'A személyes adatokat tartalmazó adatokra vonatkozó statisztikai modellek kialakítása során fontos aggodalomra van szükség az adatvédelemre. A különböző adatvédelem határozott meghatározását kínálja a magánélet, és számos adatvédelmi probléma megoldására használható. Több megoldást javasoltak az érzékeny információkat tartalmazó adatkészletek differenciálisan magánjellegű átalakítására. Az ilyen transzformációs algoritmusok azonban a folyamat során hozzáadott zaj miatt rossz hasznot nyújtanak a Natural Language Processing (NLP) feladatokban. Ez a tanulmány ezt a problémát azzal foglalkozik, hogy segédprogram-megőrző, differenciálisan privát szövegtranszformációs algoritmust biztosít automatikus kódolókkal. Algoritmusunk átalakítja a szöveget, hogy robusztusságot nyújtson a támadásokkal szemben, és kiváló szemantikai minőségű átalakításokat hoz létre, amelyek jól teljesítik a downstream NLP feladatokat. Bizonyítjuk algoritmusunk elméleti adatvédelmi garanciáját, és felmérjük annak adatvédelmi szivárgását a Membership Inference Attacks (MIA) alatt átalakított adatokkal kiképzett modelleken. Eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt modell jobban teljesít MIA támadásokkal szemben, miközben az alapul szolgáló transzformációs folyamat hasznosságában kisebb vagy semmilyen romlást kínál, mint a meglévő alapkövetek.', 'el': 'Η προστασία της ιδιωτικής ζωής αποτελεί σημαντικό ζήτημα κατά τη δημιουργία στατιστικών μοντέλων για δεδομένα που περιέχουν προσωπικές πληροφορίες. Το διαφορικό απόρρητο προσφέρει έναν ισχυρό ορισμό της ιδιωτικής ζωής και μπορεί να χρησιμοποιηθεί για την επίλυση διάφορων προβλημάτων απορρήτου. Έχουν προταθεί πολλαπλές λύσεις για τον διαφοροποιημένο-ιδιωτικό μετασχηματισμό συνόλων δεδομένων που περιέχουν ευαίσθητες πληροφορίες. Ωστόσο, τέτοιοι αλγόριθμοι μετασχηματισμού προσφέρουν κακή χρησιμότητα σε εργασίες επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας (λόγω θορύβου που προστίθεται στη διαδικασία. Αυτή η εργασία αντιμετωπίζει αυτό το ζήτημα παρέχοντας έναν αλγόριθμο μετασχηματισμού κειμένου που διατηρεί διαφορετικά ιδιωτικά εργαλεία χρησιμοποιώντας αυτόματους κωδικοποιητές. Ο αλγόριθμος μας μετασχηματίζει το κείμενο για να προσφέρει ανθεκτικότητα στις επιθέσεις και παράγει μετασχηματισμούς με υψηλή σημασιολογική ποιότητα που αποδίδουν καλά σε μεταγενέστερες εργασίες. Αποδεικνύουμε τη θεωρητική εγγύηση απορρήτου του αλγόριθμου μας και αξιολογούμε τη διαρροή απορρήτου του στο πλαίσιο Επίθεσης Συμπερασμάτων Μέλους (ΜΙΑ) σε μοντέλα εκπαιδευμένα με μετασχηματισμένα δεδομένα. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο αποδίδει καλύτερα ενάντια στις επιθέσεις ενώ προσφέρει χαμηλότερη έως καθόλου υποβάθμιση στη χρησιμότητα της υποκείμενης διαδικασίας μετασχηματισμού σε σύγκριση με τις υπάρχουσες γραμμές βάσης.', 'ka': 'პირადიურობა მნიშვნელოვანია, როდესაც პირადიური ინფორმაციის შესახებ სტატისტიკალური მოდელების შექმნა. განსხვავებული პრივისატების განსაზღვრება პრივისატების ძალიან განსაზღვრება და შეიძლება გამოყენება რამდენიმე პრივისატების განსაზღვრებისთვის. განსხვავებულად პირადი განსაცემებისთვის მონაცემების განსაცემებისთვის განსაცემებითი ინფორმაციას მომხმარებულია. მაგრამ ასეთი ტრანფიგურაციის ალგორიტემი პროცესში დამატებული სიტყვების პროცესი (NLP) დავალების ცოტა სუტილიტება. ეს დოკუმენტი ამ პრობლემას მისამართება, განსხვავებული პირადი ტექსტის გარემოქცევის ალგორიტიმის გამოყენებით სუტელიტის შენახვა. ჩვენი ალგორიტიმა ტექსტის გარცნობა, რომელიც ატაკების ძალიან ძალიან გარცნობა და გამოვიყენება გარცნობა, რომელიც უფრო ძალიან გავაკეთებს NLP დავალებში. ჩვენ ჩვენი ალგორიტიმს თეორეტიკური პრივიატიური დარანტია და გავაკეთებთ თავის პრივიატიური გამოწვება, რომელიც ჩვენი ადამიანების ინფერენციის ატაქტირების (MIA) მოდელში, რომლებიც გარცნევა ჩვენი წარმოდგენები ჩვენი მოდელს უფრო უფრო მუშაობს MIA-ს ატაკების განმავლობაში, როდესაც არაფერი დეგრადიაციას უფრო მცირებელი რენფორმაციის პროცესის სუტილ', 'it': "La privacy è una preoccupazione importante quando si creano modelli statistici su dati contenenti informazioni personali. La privacy differenziale offre una forte definizione di privacy e può essere utilizzata per risolvere diversi problemi di privacy. Sono state proposte molteplici soluzioni per la trasformazione differenziatamente privata di set di dati contenenti informazioni sensibili. Tuttavia, tali algoritmi di trasformazione offrono scarsa utilità nelle attività di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale (NLP) a causa del rumore aggiunto nel processo. Questo articolo affronta questo problema fornendo un algoritmo di trasformazione del testo differenzialmente privato che preserva l'utilità utilizzando encoder automatici. Il nostro algoritmo trasforma il testo per offrire robustezza contro gli attacchi e produce trasformazioni con alta qualità semantica che funzionano bene sulle attività NLP a valle. Dimostriamo la garanzia teorica sulla privacy del nostro algoritmo e valutiamo la sua perdita di privacy sotto Membership Inference Attacks (MIA) su modelli addestrati con dati trasformati. I nostri risultati mostrano che il modello proposto si comporta meglio contro gli attacchi MIA, offrendo al contempo una minore o nessuna degradazione nell'utilità del processo di trasformazione sottostante rispetto alle linee di base esistenti.", 'kk': 'Жеке мәліметті жеке мәліметті бар деректерге статистикалық моделдерді құру үшін өте маңызды қатынас бар. Түрлі жеке тәуелсіздігі жеке тәуелсіздік анықтамасын ұсынады. Бірнеше жеке тәуелсіздік қатынасын шешу үшін қолданылады. Бірнеше шешім өзгертілген деректер жиындарының мәліметті басқа түрлендіру үшін ұсынылды. Бірақ бұл түрлендіру алгоритмдері процестің қосылған дыбыс себебі, Түзіндік тіл процессінде (NLP) тапсырмалардың көп утилитасын ұсынады. Бұл қағаз бұл мәселеді автокодерлерді қолдану үшін утилиталық сақтау алгоритм арқылы жалпы мәтін түрлендіру алгоритмін береді. Алгоритміздің мәтінді жағдайлардың қарсылығына қарсылығын түрлендіру үшін мәтінді түрлендіру және NLP тапсырмаларында жақсы істейтін семантикалық сапатты өзгерту үшін жа Алгоритміздің теоретикалық жеке қауіпсіздігін тексеріп, өзінің жеке қауіпсіздігін бөліміздің (МИА) бағытталған деректермен оқыту үлгілерін бақылаймыз. Біздің нәтижелеріміз, келтірілген модель MIA жағдайларына қарсы жақсы жұмыс істейді, бірақ негізгі түрлендіру процесінің утилитасында, негізгі жолдарына салыстырып, төмендету процесін', 'mk': "Приватноста е важна загриженост кога се градат статистички модели на податоци кои содржат лични информации. Различната приватност нуди силна дефиниција на приватноста и може да се користи за решавање на неколку загрижености за приватноста. Повеќе решенија се предложени за диференцијално-приватната трансформација на наборите на податоци кои содржат чувствителни информации. Сепак, ваквите алгоритми за трансформација нудат лоша корисност во задачите за процес на природен јазик (НЛП) поради врева додадена во процесот. Оваа хартија го решава ова прашање со обезбедување на алгоритм за претворање на приватен текст со користење на автоматски кодери за зачувување на корисноста. Нашиот алгоритм го трансформира текстот за да понуди силност против нападите и произведува трансформирања со висок семантичен квалитет кои извршуваат добро на должните NLP задачи. We prove our algorithm's theoretical privacy guarantee and assess its privacy leakage under Membership Inference Attacks (MIA) on models trained with transformed data.  Нашите резултати покажуваат дека предложениот модел е подобар против нападите на МИА, додека нуди пониска до никаква деградација во корисноста на основниот процес на трансформација во споредба со постојните бази.", 'lt': 'Privatumas yra svarbus susirūpinimas kuriant statistinius modelius, pagrįstus duomenimis, kuriuose pateikiama asmens informacija. Skirtingas privatumas suteikia tvirtą privatumo apibrėžimą ir gali būti naudojamas keletui privatumo problemų spręsti. Buvo siūlomi keli skirtingai privataus duomenų rinkinių, kuriuose pateikiama jautri informacija, transformavimo sprendimai. Tačiau tokie transformacijos algoritmai dėl procese pridėto triukšmo teikia prastą naudą gamtinės kalbos apdorojimo (NLP) užduotims. Šiame dokumente šis klausimas sprendžiamas teikiant naudingumo išsaugojimo skirtingai privataus teksto transformacijos algoritmą naudojant automatinius kodus. Mūsų algoritmas keičia tekstą, kad pasiūlytų tvirtumą prieš atakus ir sukuria aukštos semantinės kokybės transformacijas, kurios gerai atlieka tolesnes NLP užduotis. Mes įrodome savo algoritmo teorinę privatumo garantiją ir vertiname jo privatumo nutekėjimą pagal narystės Inferencijos Attacks (MIA) naudojant modelius, apmokytus iš pakeistų duomenų. Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad siūlomas modelis veikia geriau prieš MIA išpuolius, o pagrindinio transformavimo proceso naudingumas, palyginti su esamomis bazinėmis linijomis, yra mažesnis ir nesumažėjantis.', 'mt': 'Il-privatezza hija tħassib importanti meta jinbnew mudelli statistiċi fuq dejta li fiha informazzjoni personali. Il-privatezza differenzjali toffri definizzjoni qawwija tal-privatezza u tista’ tintuża biex tissolva diversi tħassib dwar il-privatezza. Ġew proposti diversi soluzzjonijiet għat-trasformazzjoni differenzjalment-privata ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta li fihom informazzjoni sensittiva. However, such transformation algorithms offer poor utility in Natural Language Processing (NLP) tasks due to noise added in the process.  Dan id-dokument jindirizza din il-kwistjoni billi jipprovdi algoritmu ta’ trasformazzjoni tat-test privat li jippreserva l-utilità bl-użu ta’ awto-kodifikaturi. L-algoritmu tagħna jittrasforma t-test biex joffri robustezza kontra l-attakki u jipproduċi trasformazzjonijiet b’kwalità semantika għolja li jwettqu tajjeb fuq kompiti downstream NLP. Aħna nipprovaw il-garanzija teoretika tal-privatezza tal-algoritmu tagħna u nivvalutaw it-tnixxija tal-privatezza tagħha taħt Attakki ta’ Inferenza tal-Membri (MIA) fuq mudelli mħarrġa b’dejta trasformata. Ir-riżultati tagħna juru li l-mudell propost iwettaq prestazzjoni aħjar kontra l-attakki tal-MIA filwaqt li joffri inqas għal ebda degradazzjoni fl-utilità tal-proċess ta’ trasformazzjoni sottostanti meta mqabbel mal-linji bażi eżistenti.', 'mn': 'Хувийн байдал нь хувийн мэдээллийг агуулдаг статистикийн загваруудыг бүтээхэд чухал асуудал юм. Өөр өөр хувьцааны амьдралын тодорхойлолт нь хувьцааны тухай хүчтэй тодорхойлолт өгч, хувьцааны асуудлыг шийдэхэд ашиглаж болно. Мэдээллийн мэдээллийг агуулдаг өгөгдлийн сангуудын өөр өөр хувийн өөрчлөлт хийх олон шийдэл санал болсон. Гэвч ийм өөрчлөлтийн алгоритм нь байгалийн хэл процесс (NLP) даалгавруудын тулд хөдөлгөөн нэмэгдсэн дуу шалтгааныг ашигладаг. Энэ цаас энэ асуудлыг автокодчуудыг ашиглан өөр өөр хувийн текст шилжүүлэлтийн алгоритм боловсруулах хэрэгсэл хангалттай болгож тайлбарладаг. Бидний алгоритм нь текстүүдийг дайралтуудын эсрэг хүчирхэг байдлыг өөрчилж, NLP-ын ажиллагаанд сайн ажилладаг semantic чанартай өөрчлөлт гаргадаг. Бид алгоритмын теоретикийн хувийн баталгааг баталж, өөрчлөгдсөн мэдээллээр сургалтын загвар дээр хувийн амьдралын шингээлийг үнэлдэг. Бидний үр дүн нь MIA-ын шигдээний эсрэг санал өгсөн загвар илүү сайн үйлдвэрлэхийг харуулж байна. Гэхдээ суурь шугам шугам дээр харьцуулахад үндсэн шилжүүлэлтийн үйлдвэрлэлийн хэрэгцээнд бага байхгүй.', 'no': 'Privatet er ein viktig bekymring når det bygger statistiske modeller på data som inneheld personlige informasjon. Forskjellige privat tilbyr ein sterk definisjon av privat og kan brukast til å løysa fleire privat-forskjeller. Fleire løysingar er foreslått for den ulike private transformasjonen av dataset som inneheld sensitiv informasjon. Desse transformasjonsalgoritene tilbyr imidlertid lite verktøy i naturspråk-prosesseringar (NLP) på grunn av støy lagt til i prosessen. Denne papiret adresserer dette problemet ved å gjera ein algoritme for å lagra eit verktøy for ulike privat teksttransformasjon med automatisk kodar. Algoritmen vårt transformerer tekst for å tilbygge kraftighet mot ataka og produserer transformasjonar med høg semantisk kvalitet som utfører godt på nedstrekke NLP-oppgåver. Vi prøver at algoritmen vårt teoretisk garanti for privat og vurderer privatsløysing under medlemsskap Inference Attacks (MIA) på modeller trengte med transformerte data. Resultatet våre viser at den foreslåde modellen utfører bedre mot MIA-ataka medan det gjer mindre til ingen degradasjon i verktøyet for den underliggende transformasjonsprosessen sammenlignet med eksisterande baselinjer.', 'ml': 'വ്യക്തിപരമായ വിവരങ്ങളുള്ള ഡേറ്റായുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പണിയുമ്പോള്\u200d സ്വകാര്യം പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു വ വ്യത്യസ്വകാര്യത്തിലുള്ള സ്വകാര്യത്തില്\u200d ഒരു ശക്തിയുള്ള സ്വകാര്യ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. കുറച്ച് സ്വകാര്യ വ വ്യത്യസ്തമായ-സ്വകാര്യ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ച് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പല പരിഹാരങ്ങള എന്നാലും പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d ചേര്\u200dത്ത ശബ്ദം കൊണ്ട് ഈ മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകള്\u200d സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളില്\u200d പാര്\u200dത് ഈ പേപ്പറിന്റെ പ്രശ്നത്തില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായി ഉപയോഗ്യ-സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d സ്വകാര്യ പദാവലി മാറ്റുന്നതിന്റെ ആല്\u200dഗ Our algorithm transforms text to offer robustness against attacks and produces transformations with high semantic quality that perform well on downstream NLP tasks.  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മിന്\u200dറെ സ്വകാര്യത്തിലുള്ള സ്വകാര്യത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും അതിന്\u200dറെ സ്വകാര്യത്തിലുള്ള ലീക്കേജ് നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നു.  നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നിലവിലുള്ള ബെസ്റ്റെലിനെക്കാള്\u200d താഴെയില്ലാത്ത മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ ഉപയോഗത്തില്\u200d മാറ്', 'ms': 'Peribadi adalah masalah penting bila membina model statistik pada data yang mengandungi maklumat peribadi. Privasi berbeza menawarkan definisi kuat privasi dan boleh digunakan untuk menyelesaikan beberapa masalah privasi. Banyak penyelesaian telah diusulkan untuk pengubahsuaian peribadi-berbeza bagi set data yang mengandungi maklumat sensitif. Namun, algoritma perubahan tersebut menawarkan utiliti yang buruk dalam tugas Proses Bahasa Alami (NLP) disebabkan bunyi ditambah dalam proses. Kertas ini menghadapi isu ini dengan menyediakan algoritma pengubahsuaian teks peribadi yang berbeza menggunakan pengekod-sendiri. Algoritma kita mengubah teks untuk menawarkan ketepatan terhadap serangan dan menghasilkan perubahan dengan kualiti semantik tinggi yang berjalan dengan baik pada tugas NLP turun. Kami membuktikan jaminan privasi teori algoritma kami dan menilai kebocoran privasi di bawah Membership Inference Attacks (MIA) pada model yang dilatih dengan data berubah. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahawa model yang diusulkan berfungsi lebih baik terhadap serangan MIA sementara menawarkan lebih rendah untuk tiada kerosakan dalam utiliti proses pengubahan yang didasarkan dibandingkan dengan garis dasar yang wujud.', 'pl': 'Prywatność jest ważną kwestią przy budowaniu modeli statystycznych na danych zawierających dane osobowe. Prywatność różnicowa oferuje silną definicję prywatności i może być wykorzystana do rozwiązania kilku problemów związanych z prywatnością. Zaproponowano wiele rozwiązań dla różnicowo-prywatnej transformacji zbiorów danych zawierających informacje wrażliwe. Jednak takie algorytmy transformacji oferują słabe użyteczności w zadaniach Natural Language Processing (NLP) ze względu na szumy dodawane w procesie. Niniejszy artykuł rozwiązuje ten problem, zapewniając zachowanie różnicowo prywatnego algorytmu transformacji tekstu przy użyciu automatycznych koderów. Nasz algorytm transformuje tekst, aby zapewnić solidność przed atakami i tworzy transformacje o wysokiej jakości semantycznej, które sprawdzają się dobrze w dalszych zadaniach NLP. Udowodniamy teoretyczną gwarancję prywatności naszego algorytmu i oceniamy jego wyciek prywatności w ramach ataków inferencyjnych członkostwa (MIA) na modelach przeszkolonych przekształconymi danymi. Nasze wyniki pokazują, że proponowany model działa lepiej przeciwko atakom MIA, oferując jednocześnie niższą lub bez degradacji użyteczności procesu transformacji podstawowej w porównaniu do istniejących linii bazowych.', 'ro': 'Confidențialitatea este o preocupare importantă atunci când se construiește modele statistice pe date care conțin informații personale. Confidențialitatea diferențială oferă o definiție puternică a confidențialității și poate fi utilizată pentru a rezolva mai multe probleme legate de confidențialitate. Au fost propuse mai multe soluții pentru transformarea diferențial-privată a seturilor de date care conțin informații sensibile. Cu toate acestea, astfel de algoritmi de transformare oferă utilitate slabă în sarcinile de procesare a limbajului natural (NLP) din cauza zgomotului adăugat în proces. Această lucrare abordează această problemă prin furnizarea unui algoritm de transformare a textului diferențial privat care păstrează utilitatea utilizând codoare auto. Algoritmul nostru transformă textul pentru a oferi robustețe împotriva atacurilor și produce transformări cu o calitate semantică ridicată, care funcționează bine pe sarcinile din aval NLP. Demonstrăm garanția teoretică de confidențialitate a algoritmului nostru și evaluăm scurgerile sale de confidențialitate în cadrul Atacurilor de Inferență Membership (MIA) pe modele instruite cu date transformate. Rezultatele noastre arată că modelul propus performează mai bine împotriva atacurilor MIA, oferind în același timp o degradare mai mică sau fără degradare în utilitatea procesului de transformare subiacent comparativ cu liniile de bază existente.', 'sr': 'Privatnost je važna zabrinutost kada se izgradi statistički modeli podataka koji sadrže osobne informacije. Različna privatnost nudi jaku definiciju privatnosti i može se koristiti za rešenje nekoliko zabrinutosti privatnosti. Predloženo je višestruko rješenja za diferencijalno-privatnu transformaciju seta podataka koje sadrže osjetljive informacije. Međutim, takvi transformacijski algoritmi nude lošu korisnost u zadacima prirodnog procesa jezika (NLP) zbog dodanog buke u procesu. Ovaj papir rješava ovo pitanje pružanjem algoritma za privatnu transformaciju teksta sa automatskim koderima. Naš algoritam transformiše tekst da ponudi robotu protiv napada i proizvodi transformacije sa visokom semantičkom kvalitetom koji dobro izvode na spuštanju NLP zadataka. Dokazujemo teorijsku garanciju privatnosti našeg algoritma i procjenjujemo procjenu privatnosti pod napadima članstva Inferencije (MIA) o modelima obučenim transformiranim podacima. Naši rezultati pokazuju da predloženi model bolji izvodi protiv napada na MIA dok nudi niže degradaciji u koristi temeljnog procesa transformacije u usporedbi sa postojećim osnovnim linijama.', 'si': 'පෞද්ගලිකතාවය තමයි පෞද්ගලික තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධයෙන් තියෙන සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මක මොඩේල් නිර්ම විවිධ පුද්ගලිකතාවට පුද්ගලික විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් පුද්ගලික විශ්වාස කරන්න සහ පුද්ගලිකතාවක්  ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ වෙනස් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක නමුත්, ස්වභාවික භාෂාව (NLP) ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපනය (ස්වභාවික භාෂාව) වැඩකට අවශ්\u200dය භාවිතාවක් සඳහා මෙහෙම මේ පැත්තේ මෙම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවක් සඳහා වෙනස් පුද්ගලික පාළුවක් වෙනස් විදිහට පුද්ගලික වෙනස් ක අපේ ඇල්ගෝරිත්මය පාළුවන් වෙනස් කරනවා පහර දෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විරුද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් විස්තර කරනව අපි අපේ ඇල්ගෝරිතම්ගේ සාධාරණික පුද්ගලිකත්වය ගැන සාක්ෂා කරනවා ඒ වගේම පුද්ගලිකත්වය පුද්ගලිකත්වය සඳහා පුද්ගලිකත්වය පුද් අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ මොඩල් එක MIA පහර දුන්න විරුද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් හොඳයි කියලා ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වග', 'so': 'Sida gaarka loo leeyahay waa mid muhiim ah marka la dhiso tusaalooyin takhasuska ah oo ku saabsan macluumaadka shakhsiga ah. Inta gaarka ah ee kala duduwan waxaa bixiya aqoon xoog badan oo gaar loo leeyahay, waxaana loo isticmaali karaa inay xalliyaan arrimo badan oo gaar loo leeyahay. Waxaa loo talo galay xalal badan oo loo beddelo si kala duwan oo gaar ah oo ku jirta macluumaadka xilsan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee jardiinada is-beddelka waxay isticmaalaan faa’iido baahan oo ku saabsan jardiinada afka asalka ah (NLP) codka lagu daro darteed. Qoraalkan ayaa warqaddan ku saabsan arimahan si gaar ah loo isticmaalo algorithm macluumaadka beddelinta ee gaarka loo leeyahay. Algorithmeteena wuxuu bedeshaa qoraal si uu u bixiyo boosaska dhicidda kadibna uu u sameeyo beddelmo, si aad u fiican u sameeyo shaqaalaha NLP hoose. Waxaannu caddeynaa garashada gaarka loo leeyahay algorithmka iyo qiimeynaynaa qashinka gaarka loo leeyahay oo ka hoosaysa qashinka xubnaha ku jira samooyinka lagu tababaray macluumaadka beddelan. Abaalkayaga waxaa tusinaya in muusikada la soo jeeday ay ay ka samaysaa wax ka wanaagsan weerarka MIA, marka lagu siiyo wax aan hoos u dhigin isticmaalka tartanka hoose ee beddelka hoose iyadoo la barbardhiga sameynta heerarka joogta.', 'sv': 'Sekretess är ett viktigt problem när man bygger statistiska modeller på data som innehåller personuppgifter. Differentiell integritet erbjuder en stark definition av integritet och kan användas för att lösa flera integritetsfrågor. Flera lösningar har föreslagits för differentialt privat omvandling av dataset som innehåller känslig information. Sådana transformationsalgoritmer erbjuder dock dålig användbarhet i Natural Language Processing (NLP) uppgifter på grund av brus som läggs till i processen. Denna uppsats behandlar detta problem genom att tillhandahålla en algoritm för differentialt privat textomvandling med hjälp av autokodare. Vår algoritm omvandlar text för att erbjuda robusthet mot attacker och producerar transformationer med hög semantisk kvalitet som presterar bra på nedströms NLP-uppgifter. Vi bevisar vår algoritms teoretiska integritetsgaranti och bedömer dess sekretessläckage under Membership Inference Attacks (MIA) på modeller som tränats med transformerad data. Våra resultat visar att den föreslagna modellen presterar bättre mot MIA-attacker samtidigt som den erbjuder lägre eller ingen försämring av nyttan av den underliggande transformationsprocessen jämfört med befintliga baslinjer.', 'ta': 'தனியார் வித்தியாசமான தனியார்ச்சி ஒரு வலிமையான தனிப்பட்ட விளக்கம் வழங்குகிறது மற்றும் பல தனியார்ந்த கவலைகளை தீர்வு செய் பல தீர்வுகள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது உணர்வுடைய தகவல் உள்ள தரவுத்தளங்களின் தனிப்பட்ட- தனிப்பட்ட மாற்றம் ஆனால், இத்தகைய மாற்றம் முறைமைகள் இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாடு (NLP) பணிகளில் குறைவான பயன்பாடுகளை வழங்குகிறது செயல்பாட்டில் சேர @ info எங்கள் ஆல்gorithm உரையை மாற்றுகிறது தாக்குகள் எதிராக மாற்றும் மற்றும் மாற்றங்களை உண்டாக்குகிறது அதிக பாதிப்பு தரம் அது NLP பணிகளி நாங்கள் எங்கள் ஆல்பரிட்டத்தின் தனிப்பட்ட பாதுகாப்பு மற்றும் அமர்வு துண்டிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளில் மாற்றப்பட்ட தகவல் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகள முடிவு', 'ur': 'خصوصی ایک اہم مشکل ہے جب شخصی معلومات کے بارے میں ڈاٹیٹوں پر ایسٹیسٹی موڈل بناتے ہیں۔ مختلف خصوصی کی تعریف خصوصی کی سخت تعریف کرتی ہے اور بہت سی خصوصی مشکلات کو حل کرنے کے لئے استعمال کر سکتی ہے. بہت سی حل پیشنهاد کیے گئے ہیں ڈیٹسٹ کے متفرق خصوصی تغییرات کے لئے جن میں حساس معلومات ہے. However, such transformation algorithms offer poor utility in Natural Language Processing (NLP) tasks due to noise added in the process. This paper addresses this issue by providing a utility-preserving differently private text transformation algorithm using auto-encoders. ہمارا الگوریٹم تغییر دیتا ہے کہ ان حملوں کے خلاف مضبوطی کے ساتھ تغییر پیدا کرے اور ان کے ساتھ بلند سیمنٹی کیفیت کے ساتھ تغییر پیدا کرے جو نیچے نیچے NLP کے کاموں پر اچھی طرح عمل کرتے ہیں. ہم نے اپنے الگوریٹم کی نظریہ خصوصی غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر ہمارے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد مدل MIA حملہ کے مقابلہ میں بہتر عمل کرتا ہے حالانکہ اس کے ذریعہ بنیاس لینٹوں کے مقابلہ میں کوئی کم تغییر پرسس کے فائدہ کے ذریعہ ذلیل نہیں کرتا۔', 'uz': "Shaxsiy maʼlumot yordamida statistik modellarini yaratishda shaxsiy muhim muhim. Бошқа махфий шахслар махфий маълумотни кўриб туради ва кўп махфий гуруҳларни ҳал этиш учун фойдаланади. Name Shunday qilib, bu ўзгартириш algorithlari jarayonini tabiiy tillar jarayonini (NLP) vazifalarida yoqish qoʻshilgan holatni yaratadi. Ushbu qogʻoz avto- kodlash usuli yordamida boshqa shaxsiy matn oʻzgarishni saqlash algoritni ishlatadi. Our algorithm transforms text to offer robustness against attacks and produces transformations with high semantic quality that perform well on downstream NLP tasks.  Biz algoritmizning theoretikal shaxsiyatlarini tasdiqlash va o'zgartirilgan maʼlumot bilan o'rganilgan modellarda shaxsiy harakatlarni qiymatmiz. Bizning natijalarimizni ko'rsatadi, talab qilingan modeli MIA haqida yaxshi bajaradi va mavjud asboblar bilan kamaytirilgan asosiy o'zgarishlar jarayonlaridan kamaytirish imkoniyatini kamaytirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Việc riêng tư là một mối quan tâm quan trọng khi xây dựng các mô hình thống kê về dữ liệu cá nhân. Sự riêng tư khác nhau cho thấy một định nghĩa mạnh mẽ về sự riêng tư và có thể được dùng để giải quyết vài vấn đề riêng tư. Nhiều giải pháp đã được đề xuất cho sự chuyển đổi riêng tư của bộ dữ liệu chứa thông tin nhạy cảm. Tuy nhiên, các thuật to án biến đổi này có tác dụng kém trong việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (chọc ngoáy ngôn ngữ) do nhiễu thêm trong quá trình. Tờ giấy này giải quyết vấn đề này bằng cách cung cấp một thuật toán chuyển dạng văn bản riêng biệt bảo tồn tiện ích. Thuật to án của chúng tôi biến đổi văn bản để phục hồi sức mạnh chống lại các cuộc tấn công và tạo ra biến đổi với chất lượng luân lýStencils cao và hoạt động tốt trong các công việc xuôi dòng. Chúng tôi chứng minh rằng thuật toán bảo đảm bảo bảo mật cá nhân lí thuyết của chúng ta đánh giá s ự rò rỉ của nó dựa trên các mẫu được huấn luyện với dữ liệu biến đổi. Những kết quả của chúng tôi cho thấy kiểu mẫu này tiến triển tốt hơn chống lại các vụ tấn công MIA trong khi nó không có tác dụng giảm thiểu trong việc sử dụng của tiến trình chuyển đổi cơ bản so với những cơ sở cơ bản đã có.', 'bg': 'Поверителността е важен проблем при изграждането на статистически модели на данни, съдържащи лична информация. Диференциалната неприкосновеност на личния живот предлага силно определение за неприкосновеност на личния живот и може да се използва за решаване на няколко проблема с неприкосновеността на личния живот. Предложени са множество решения за диференциално-частна трансформация на набори от данни, съдържащи чувствителна информация. Въпреки това, такива алгоритми за трансформация предлагат лоша полезност в задачите за обработка на естествения език (НЛП) поради шума, добавен в процеса. Тази статия разглежда този проблем, като предоставя алгоритъм за диференциално частна трансформация на текста, използващ автоматични кодери. Нашият алгоритъм трансформира текста, за да предложи здравина срещу атаки и произвежда трансформации с високо семантично качество, които изпълняват добре задачи надолу по веригата. Доказваме теоретичната гаранция за поверителност на нашия алгоритъм и оценяваме изтичането на поверителност в рамките на атаки за заключване на членството (МИА) върху модели, обучени с трансформирани данни. Нашите резултати показват, че предложеният модел се представя по-добре срещу атаки, като същевременно предлага по-ниска или никаква деградация в полезността на основния процес на трансформация в сравнение със съществуващите базови линии.', 'nl': 'Privacy is een belangrijk aandachtspunt bij het bouwen van statistische modellen op gegevens die persoonlijke informatie bevatten. Differentiële privacy biedt een sterke definitie van privacy en kan worden gebruikt om verschillende privacyproblemen op te lossen. Er zijn meerdere oplossingen voorgesteld voor de differentieel-private transformatie van datasets die gevoelige informatie bevatten. Dergelijke transformatie algoritmen bieden echter weinig nut in Natural Language Processing (NLP)-taken als gevolg van ruis toegevoegd in het proces. Dit artikel behandelt dit probleem door een utility-conserving differentieel private text transformatie algoritme te bieden met behulp van auto-encoders. Ons algoritme transformeert tekst om robuustheid te bieden tegen aanvallen en produceert transformaties met hoge semantische kwaliteit die goed presteren bij downstream NLP-taken. We bewijzen de theoretische privacygarantie van ons algoritme en beoordelen de privacylekkage onder Membership Inference Attacks (MIA) op modellen getraind met getransformeerde data. Onze resultaten tonen aan dat het voorgestelde model beter presteert tegen MIA-aanvallen, terwijl het lagere tot geen degradatie biedt in het nut van het onderliggende transformatieproces in vergelijking met bestaande basislijnen.', 'da': 'Privatliv er et vigtigt anliggende, når der opbygges statistiske modeller på data, der indeholder personlige oplysninger. Differentieret privatliv giver en stærk definition af privatlivets fred og kan bruges til at løse flere problemer vedrørende privatlivets fred. Der er foreslået flere løsninger til differentialt privat transformation af datasæt, der indeholder følsomme oplysninger. Men sådanne transformationsalgoritmer tilbyder dårlig nytte i Natural Language Processing (NLP) opgaver på grund af støj tilføjet i processen. Dette dokument løser dette problem ved at levere en algoritme til differentieret privat teksttransformation, der bevarer hjælp af auto-encodere. Vores algoritme transformerer tekst for at tilbyde robusthed mod angreb og producerer transformationer med høj semantisk kvalitet, der udfører godt på downstream NLP-opgaver. Vi beviser vores algoritmes teoretiske privatlivsgaranti og vurderer dens privatlivslækage under Membership Inference Attacks (MIA) på modeller trænet med transformerede data. Vores resultater viser, at den foreslåede model klarer sig bedre mod MIA-angreb, samtidig med at den tilbyder lavere eller ingen nedbrydning i nytten af den underliggende transformationsproces sammenlignet med eksisterende basislinjer.', 'hr': 'Privatnost je važna zabrinutost u izgradnji statističkih modela podataka koji sadrže osobne informacije. Različna privatnost nudi jaku definiciju privatnosti i može se koristiti za rješavanje nekoliko zabrinutosti privatnosti. Predloženo je višestruko rješenje za diferencijalno-privatnu transformaciju podataka koje sadrže osjetljive informacije. Međutim, takvi transformacijski algoritmi nude lošu korisnost u zadatkima prirodnog procesa jezika (NLP) zbog dodanog buke u procesu. Ovaj papir rješava to pitanje omogućavajući algoritam preobraćanja privatnog teksta koji sačuva korištenje automatskih kodera. Naš algoritam transformiše tekst kako bi ponudio robustnost protiv napada i proizvodio transformacije sa visokom semantičkom kvalitetom koji dobro obavljaju na spuštanjim zadacima NLP-a. Dokazujemo teorijsku garanciju privatnosti našeg algoritma i procijenimo procjenu privatnosti pod napadima članstva Inferencije (MIA) o modelima obučenim transformiranim podacima. Naši rezultati pokazuju da predloženi model bolji izvodi protiv napada na MIA-u dok nudi niže degradaciji u koristi temeljnog procesa transformacije u usporedbi s postojećim osnovnim linijama.', 'de': 'Datenschutz ist ein wichtiges Anliegen bei der Erstellung statistischer Modelle für Daten, die personenbezogene Informationen enthalten. Differential Privacy bietet eine starke Definition von Privatsphäre und kann verwendet werden, um verschiedene Datenschutzprobleme zu lösen. Es wurden mehrere Lösungen für die differentiell-private Transformation von Datensätzen vorgeschlagen, die sensible Informationen enthalten. Allerdings bieten solche Transformationsalgorithmen aufgrund von Rauschen, die im Prozess hinzugefügt werden, einen schlechten Nutzen in Natural Language Processing (NLP)-Aufgaben. Dieser Beitrag behandelt dieses Problem, indem ein utility-erhaltender differential private Text Transformation Algorithmus mit Auto-Encoder bereitgestellt wird. Unser Algorithmus transformiert Text, um Robustheit gegen Angriffe zu bieten und erzeugt Transformationen mit hoher semantischer Qualität, die sich gut für nachgelagerte NLP-Aufgaben eignen. Wir beweisen die theoretische Datenschutzgarantie unseres Algorithmus und bewerten seine Datenschutzleckage unter Membership Inference Attacks (MIA) an Modellen, die mit transformierten Daten trainiert wurden. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass das vorgeschlagene Modell besser gegen MIA-Angriffe abschneidet und gleichzeitig den Nutzen des zugrunde liegenden Transformationsprozesses im Vergleich zu bestehenden Baselines geringer bis gar nicht verschlechtert.', 'ko': '개인 정보를 포함하는 데이터에 대해 통계 모델을 구축할 때 프라이버시는 중요한 문제이다.차이 프라이버시는 프라이버시에 대해 강력한 정의를 제공하여 몇 가지 프라이버시 문제를 해결할 수 있다.민감한 정보를 포함하는 데이터 집합의 차이에 대한 사유 전환은 이미 다양한 해결 방안을 제시했다.그러나 자연 언어 처리(NLP) 작업에 소음이 추가되었기 때문에 이런 변환 알고리즘의 실용성은 비교적 떨어진다.본고는 자동 인코더를 사용하는 실용성 보존 차이의 개인 텍스트 변환 알고리즘을 제공함으로써 이 문제를 해결하고자 한다.우리의 알고리즘은 텍스트를 변환하여 공격에 저항하는 루팡성을 제공하고 높은 의미의 질을 가진 변환을 생성하여 하위 NLP 작업에서 양호하게 나타낸다.Google 알고리즘의 이론적 프라이버시 보증을 증명하고 변환 데이터 트레이닝을 사용하는 모델에서 구성원 추리 공격(MIA)에 의한 프라이버시 누출을 평가했습니다.우리의 결과에 따르면 기존의 기선에 비해 제시된 모델은 MIA 공격을 더욱 잘 막을 수 있을 뿐만 아니라 밑바닥 전환 과정의 효용에 있어 더욱 낮고 심지어 퇴화되지 않았다.', 'sw': 'Binafsi ni jambo muhimu pale unapojenga mifano ya takwimu kuhusu taarifa zenye taarifa binafsi. Differential privacy offers a strong definition of privacy and can be used to solve several privacy concerns.  suluhisho mbalimbali zimependekezwa kwa mabadiliko ya binafsi tofauti ya seti za data zinazohusu taarifa za kisasa. Hata hivyo, takwimu za mabadiliko kama hizi zinatoa matumizi duni katika mchakato wa lugha za asili (NLP) kutokana na sauti zinazoongezwa katika mchakato huo. Makala hii inazungumzia suala hili kwa kutoa algorithi ya mabadiliko ya maandishi binafsi kwa kutumia kodi binafsi. Ualgorithi wetu hubadilisha ujumbe wa maandishi ili kutoa ubakaji dhidi ya mashambulizi na kutengeneza mabadiliko yenye kiwango kikubwa cha sekunde kinachofanya vizuri katika kazi za NLP chini ya mto. Tunawathibitisha uhakika wa faragha ya nadharia ya utaalamu wetu na kutathmini utoaji wake wa faragha chini ya Shambulio la Kuingilia Huduma (MIA) kwenye mifano inayofundishwa kwa taarifa za mabadiliko. Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kuwa muundo huu unapendekezwa unafanya vizuri dhidi ya mashambulizi ya MIA wakati huo unaposaidia kupungua kwa kutumia mchakato wa mabadiliko wa msingi ukilinganisha na misingi yanayopo.', 'fa': 'خصوصیت یک نگرانی مهم است وقتی ساختن مدل های آمار بر اطلاعات با اطلاعات شخصی وجود دارد. خصوصی مختلف تعریف قوی خصوصی را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد و می\u200cتواند برای حل چند نگرانی خصوصی استفاده شود. راه حل\u200cهای زیادی برای تغییر داده\u200cهای مختلف و خصوصی با اطلاعات حساسی پیشنهاد شده\u200cاند. ولی این الگوریتم\u200cهای تغییر تغییر دادن به سبب صدای اضافه شدن در این فرایند، کارهای زیادی در پردازش زبان طبیعی (NLP) پیشنهاد می\u200cکنند. این کاغذ با استفاده از یک الگوریتم تغییر متن خصوصی مختلف با استفاده از رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cهای خودکار به این مسئله دریافت می\u200cکند. الگوریتم ما متن را تغییر می\u200cدهد تا بر خلاف حمله قوی پیشنهاد دهد و تغییرات با کیفیت طبیعی بالا را تولید کند که در کار های NLP پایین خوب انجام می\u200cدهد. ما ثابت می کنیم که تضمین خصوصی نظریه الگوریتم ما را ثابت می کنیم و تغییر داده های تغییر داده شده را تحت حمله های عضو عضو عضو عضو عضو عضو (MIA) بر مدلها آموزش داده شده است. نتیجه\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل پیشنهاد بر خلاف حمله\u200cهای MIA بهتر عمل می\u200cکند، در حالی که در مورد استفاده از فرایند تغییر پایین در مقایسه با خطوط پایین\u200cهای موجود، کمتری برای تغییر دادن به هیچ کاهش\u200c', 'tr': '힇ahsy maglumaty barlap statistik nusgalary guranda wajyp alada. D철wletli gizemli첵et gizemli첵eti gizemli첵eti g체첵챌li bir d체힊체ndiri힊i teklip ed첵채r we birn채챌e gizemli첵et meselelerini 챌철zmek 체챌in ulanyl첵ar. A챌mak 체챌in birn채챌e 챌철z체mler teklip edildi. 힇ahsy 첵agda첵y흫 체첵tgetmesi 체챌in bir n채챌e 챌철z체mler 횦철ne, bu 힊ekilde 체첵tgewler Algoritmalar Natal Dil Prozesinde (NLP) ses eklendi휓i seb채bi k철t체 i힊e yarad첵ar. Bu kagyz bu meseleni 철z-k철dlemelerini ulanan aralygy ta첵첵arlap hasaplanjak algoritidir. Bizi흫 algoritmyz teknimi salyklara gar힊y g체첵챌li teklip etmek 체챌in 체첵tged첵채r we i흫 첵okary semantik kwaliteti bilen 체첵tged첵채r. NLP i힊i barada gowy edip biljek. Biz algoritmyny흫 teori첵a 첵agda첵yny흫 garantylygyny bar첵arys we 체첵tge힊ik g체rr체흫leri (MIA) bilen 체첵tge첵채n maglumatlar bilen 체첵tge첵채n modellerinde 챌ykar첵arys. Bizi흫 netijelerimiz 힊u teklip eden nusgy흫 MIA atalaryna gar힊y has gowy etjek bolandygyny g철rkez첵채r we bu nusgy흫 i챌inde hi챌 hili degradasyon gerek bolmadygyny ol bar baz hatlary bilen g철r채.', 'af': "Privateit is 'n belangrike bekommerding wanneer statistiese modele op data bevat persoonlike inligting bou. Verskillende privateit bied 'n sterk definisie van privateit en kan gebruik word om verskeie privateitsbekommende te los. Veelvuldige oplossing is voorgestel vir die verskillende- privaat transformasie van datastelle wat sensitiewe inligting bevat. Alhoewel, sodanige transformasie algoritme baie nutsprogram in Natuurlike Taal Verwerking (NLP) taak aanbied vanweë geluid bygevoeg in die proses. Hierdie papier adres hierdie probleem deur 'n nutsprogram- behoort verskillende privaat teks- transformasie algoritme te verskaf deur outo- enkodere te gebruik. Ons algoritme transformeer teks om kragtigheid teen atake te bring en produseer transformasies met hoë semantiese kwaliteit wat goed uitvoer op onderstreem NLP-opdragte. Ons bevestig on s algoritme se teorieese privateitsgarantie en asseblief sy privateitslaai onder Membership Inference Attacks (MIA) op modele onderrig met transformeerde data. Ons resultate wys dat die voorgestelde model beter uitvoer teen MIA-atake terwyl die ondersteunde transformasie proses ondersteun met bestaande basisline nie ondersteun word nie.", 'id': 'Privasi adalah kepentingan penting ketika membangun model statistik pada data yang mengandung informasi pribadi. Privasi berbeda menawarkan definisi kuat privasi dan dapat digunakan untuk memecahkan beberapa masalah privasi. Banyak solusi telah diusulkan untuk transformasi berbeda-pribadi set data yang mengandung informasi sensitif. Namun, algoritma transformasi seperti itu menawarkan utilitas yang buruk dalam tugas Proses Bahasa Alami (NLP) karena suara ditambah dalam proses. This paper addresses this issue by providing a utility-preserving differentially private text transformation algorithm using auto-encoders.  Algoritma kita mengubah teks untuk menawarkan kekuatan terhadap serangan dan menghasilkan transformasi dengan kualitas semantis tinggi yang berhasil dalam tugas NLP turun. Kita membuktikan algoritma kita menjamin privasi teori dan menilai kebocoran privasi di bawah Membership Inference Attacks (MIA) pada model yang dilatih dengan data yang berubah. Our results show that the proposed model performs better against MIA attacks while offering lower to no degradation in the utility of the underlying transformation process compared to existing baselines.', 'am': 'የግል አዳራሽ መረጃዎችን በሚያዙ ዳታ ላይ የተለየ የስህተት ምሳሌዎችን በመሥራት የግል ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ የተለየ የግል ግልጾች የግልኙነት ግልፅ የሚያደርገውን እና ብዙዎችን የግልኙነት ጉዳዮች ለመፍታት ይችላል፡፡ በተለየ-የግል-የግል መረጃዎችን ለዳታ ማቀናቀል በብዙ ማቀናጃ ተፈቅዶአል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ እንደዚህ ለውጥ አሌጎርት ድምፅ በተጨማሪው ድምፅ ምክንያት በጥያቄ ቋንቋ ፕሮጀክት (NLP) ስራዎችን ድህነትን አቀረቡ፡፡ ይህ ፕሮግራም ጉዳዩን በተለየ የግል የጽሑፍ ለውጥ አልgorithም በራሱ-ኮድዶችን በመጠቀም የሆኑን ኃይል በመጠበቅ ይጨምርበታል፡፡ አሌጎርቲም ጽሑፎችን በጦርነት ላይ ልብስ እንዲያሰናክል እና በአውራው ውኃ ውስጥ በNLP ስራቶች ላይ መልካም የሚሠራውን ለውጦችን እንዲለውጥ ይለውጣል፡፡ የአልgorithም የtheoretical privacy ግንኙነት መግለጫ እና የብሔራዊ ግንኙነታችንን በአብረት የፍቃድ Attacks (MIA) በተለወጠው ዳታዎችን በሚያስተማሩበት model ላይ እናረጋግጣለን፡፡ ፍጥረታችን እንደተፈጸመ ሞዴል በመስጠት ላይ በሚያሳየው ማህበረሰብ ላይ የሚሻል ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Անձնական ինֆորմացիա պարունակող տվյալների վիճակագրական մոդելներ կառուցելիս կարևոր խնդիր է: Մեկ տարբեր գաղտնիության սահմանում է գաղտնիության և կարող է օգտագործվել որոշ գաղտնիության խնդիրներ լուծելու համար: Բազմաթիվ լուծումներ առաջարկել են զգայուն տեղեկատվություն պարունակող տվյալների բազմաթիվ մասնավոր փոխակերպման համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, այսպիսի վերափոխման ալգորիթմները բավականին օգտակար են տալիս բնական լեզվի վերլուծության (ՆԼՊ) խնդիրների մեջ, քանի որ այդ գործընթացում ավելացված աղմուկը: Այս թղթին լուծում է այս խնդիրը՝ տրամադրելով օգտակարության պահպանող տարբերականորեն մասնավոր տեքստի վերափոխման ալգորիթմ օգտագործելով ինքնակոդավորներ: Մեր ալգորիթմը վերափոխում է տեքստը, որպեսզի հզորություն առաջարկի հարձակումների դեմ և առաջարկում է բարձր սեմանտիկ որակի վերափոխություններ, որոնք լավ են աշխատում ՆԼՊ-ի հետագա խնդիրների վրա: Մենք ապացուցուցում ենք մեր ալգորիթմի տեսական գաղտնիքի ապահովությունը և գնահատում ենք իր գաղտնիքի թափանցումը Ամերիկյան ինֆերանսի հարձակումների (MIA) ժամանակ վերափոխված տվյալներով վարժեցված մոդելների վրա: Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկած մոդելը ավելի լավ է աշխատում MIA-ի հարձակումների դեմ, միաժամանակ ավելի ցածր և ոչ մի դեգրադացիա է առաջարկում հիմնական վերափոխման գործընթացի օգտակարության մեջ, համեմատած գոյություն ունեցող', 'bs': 'Privatnost je važna zabrinutost kada se izgradi statistički modeli podataka koji sadrže osobne informacije. Različna privatnost nudi jaku definiciju privatnosti i može se koristiti za rješavanje nekoliko zabrinutosti privatnosti. Predloženo je višestruko rješenje za diferencijalno-privatnu transformaciju seta podataka koje sadrže osjetljive informacije. Međutim, takvi transformacijski algoritmi nude lošu korisnost u zadacima prirodnog procesa jezika (NLP) zbog dodane buke u tom procesu. Ovaj papir rješava ovo pitanje pružajući algoritam za privatnu transformaciju teksta koji sačuva korištenje automatskih kodera. Naš algoritam transformiše tekst da ponudi robotu protiv napada i proizvodi transformacije sa visokom semantičkom kvalitetom koji dobro izvode na spuštanju NLP zadataka. Dokazujemo teorijsku garanciju privatnosti našeg algoritma i procijenimo procjenu privatnosti pod napadima članstva Inferencije (MIA) o modelima obučenim transformiranim podacima. Naši rezultati pokazuju da predloženi model bolji izvodi protiv napada na MIA, dok nudi niže degradaciji u koristi temeljnog procesa transformacije u usporedbi sa postojećim osnovnim linijama.', 'az': 'Şahsiyyət şəxsi məlumatları barəsində statistik modelləri inşa etdikdə möhüm bir endişedir. Müxtəlif qüvvət təhlükəsizlik qüvvətli tərzini təbliğ edir və bir neçə təhlükəsizlik məqsədilərini çəkmək üçün istifadə edilə bilər. Daha çox çətinliklər təbliğ edilmişdir ki, hissətli məlumat içərisində dağlar qurularının müxtəlif-özlü transformasiyası üçün. Lakin bu transformasyon algoritmi təbiətli dil işləməsi (NLP) işlərində zəif faydalar verir. Bu kağıt bu meseleyi avtomatik kodlayıcılar vasitəsilə müxtəlif şəxsi mətn transformasiyası algoritmi təyin edərək istifadə edir. Algoritimiz, saldıqlarına qarşı güclülük təbliğ etmək üçün mətni dəyişdirir və NLP işlərində yaxşı işlər görən yüksək semantik keyfiyyəti ilə dəyişdirir. Biz algoritminin teoriki təhlükəsizlik garantisini təsdiqləyirik və dəyişiklik verilən modellərlə təhsil edilmiş Membership Inference Attacks (MIA) altında gizli təhlükəsizliklərini təsdiqləyirik. Bizim sonuçlarımız göstərir ki, təklif edilmiş modellərin MIA saldıqlarına qarşı daha xeyirli davranır, halbuki əsas səhifələri ilə dəyişdirilmiş transformasyon prosesinin istifadəsində heç bir dəyişdirməyi təmin edir.', 'bn': 'ব্যক্তিগত তথ্য নিয়ে তথ্য নির্মাণ করার পরিসংখ্যান মডেল নির্মাণ করার সময় গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উদ্বেগ। বিভিন্ন ব্যক্তিগত গোপনীয়তার একটি শক্তিশালী সংবাদ প্রদান করে এবং বেশ কিছু গোপনীয় উদ্বেগ সমাধান করতে পারে। অনেক সমাধান প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে যেখানে সংবেদনশীল তথ্য রয়েছে ডাটাসেটের বৈষম্য-ব্যক্তিগত পরিবর্তনের জন্য। তবে এই ধরনের পরিবর্তনের অ্যালগরিদম প্রক্রিয়ায় যোগ করার কারণে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ায় অসহায়তা প্রদান করে। এই পত্রিকাটি স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে এনকোডার ব্যবহার করে ব্যক্তিগত টেক্সট পরিবর্তনের অ্যালগরিদম প্রদান করে ব্যক্তিগত টেক্সট সংরক্ আমাদের অ্যালগরিদম আক্রমণের বিরুদ্ধে রাস্তা প্রদান করার জন্য টেক্সট পরিবর্তন করে এবং উচ্চমাত্রিক মানে পরিবর্তন তৈরি করে যা এনএলপি ক আমরা আমাদের আলগরিদমের ততিত্বিক গোপনীয়তার নিশ্চিত এবং স্মৃতিশীল ইনফারেন্স আক্রমণের অধীনে তার ব্যক্তিগত লিকেজের মূল্য দেখাচ্ছি যে পরিবর্তন তথ আমাদের ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত মডেল মিআইএ আক্রমণের বিরুদ্ধে ভালো কাজ করে যাচ্ছে যখন বিদ্যমান নীচের পরিবর্তনের প্রক্রিয়ার তুলনা', 'sq': "Privatësia është një shqetësim i rëndësishëm kur ndërtohen modele statistike mbi të dhënat që përmbajnë informacion personal. Privatësia diferenciale ofron një përcaktim të fortë të privatësisë dhe mund të përdoret për të zgjidhur disa shqetësime të privatësisë. Shumë zgjidhje janë propozuar për transformimin ndryshe-privat të të dhënave që përmbajnë informacion të ndjeshëm. However, such transformation algorithms offer poor utility in Natural Language Processing (NLP) tasks due to noise added in the process.  Ky dokument trajton këtë çështje duke ofruar një algoritëm ndryshim të transformimit të tekstit privat që ruan shërbimet duke përdorur autokoduesit. Algoritmi ynë transformon tekstin për të ofruar forcë kundër sulmeve dhe prodhon transformime me cilësi të lartë semantike që kryejnë mirë detyrat e NLP-së. We prove our algorithm's theoretical privacy guarantee and assess its privacy leakage under Membership Inference Attacks (MIA) on models trained with transformed data.  Rezultatet tona tregojnë se modeli i propozuar funksionon më mirë kundër sulmeve të MIA ndërsa ofron më pak se asnjë degradim në dobinë e procesit të transformimit në bazë krahasuar me linjat bazë ekzistuese.", 'cs': 'Soukromí je důležitým zájmem při tvorbě statistických modelů na údajích obsahujících osobní údaje. Diferenciální soukromí nabízí silnou definici soukromí a může být použita k řešení několika problémů v oblasti soukromí. Bylo navrženo mnoho řešení pro diferenciálně-soukromou transformaci datových sad obsahujících citlivé informace. Nicméně, takové transformační algoritmy nabízejí špatnou užitečnost v úlohách Natural Language Processing (NLP) kvůli šumu přidanému v procesu. Tento článek se zabývá tímto problémem poskytnutím algoritmu transformace textu zachovávajícího diferenciálně soukromý text pomocí automatických kodérů. Náš algoritmus transformuje text tak, aby nabízel robustnost proti útokům a vytváří transformace s vysokou sémantickou kvalitou, které dobře fungují na následných úlohách NLP. Prokážeme teoretickou záruku našeho algoritmu na ochranu soukromí a hodnotíme jeho únik soukromí v rámci Membership Inference Attacks (MIA) na modelech trénovaných s transformovanými daty. Naše výsledky ukazují, že navržený model funguje lépe proti MIA útokům a přitom nabízí nižší až žádnou degradaci užitečnosti základního procesu transformace ve srovnání se stávajícími základními liniemi.', 'ca': "La privacitat és una preocupació important quan construeix models estadístics sobre dades que contenen informació personal. Differential privacy offers a strong definition of privacy and can be used to solve several privacy concerns.  S'han proposat diverses solucions per la transformació diferencial-privada de conjunts de dades que contenen informació sensible. Tanmateix, aquests algoritmes de transformació ofereixen una mala utilitat en tasques de processament de llenguatges naturals (NLP) degut al soroll afegit al procés. Aquest article aborda aquest tema proporcionant un algoritme de transformació de text diferencialment privat que conserva utilitats fent servir autocodificadors. El nostre algoritme transforma el text per oferir robustetat contra els atacs i produeix transformacions d'alta qualitat semàntica que funcionen bé en tasques de NLP avall. Demonstrem la garantia teòrica de la privacitat del nostre algoritme i valorem la seva fuga de privacitat sota Membership Inference Attacks (MIA) en models entrenats amb dades transformades. Els nostres resultats demostren que el model proposat actua millor en contra dels atacs de MIA, oferint menys o menys degradació en l'utilitat del procés de transformació subjacent comparat amb les línies de base existents.", 'et': 'Isikuandmeid sisaldavate andmete statistiliste mudelite loomisel on eraelu puutumatus oluline probleem. Diferentsiaalne privaatsus pakub privaatsuse ranget määratlust ja seda saab kasutada mitmete privaatsusprobleemide lahendamiseks. Tundlikku teavet sisaldavate andmekogumite diferentsiaalselt privaatseks muundamiseks on välja pakutud mitmeid lahendusi. Sellised transformatsioonialgoritmid pakuvad aga protsessis lisatud müra tõttu ebasoodsat kasulikkust looduskeele töötlemise (NLP) ülesannetes. Käesolevas dokumendis käsitletakse seda probleemi, pakkudes utiliiti säilitava erinevalt privaatse teksti muundamise algoritmi, kasutades automaatkodeerijaid. Meie algoritm muundab teksti, et pakkuda vastupidavust rünnakute vastu ja toodab kõrge semantilise kvaliteediga transformatsioone, mis toimivad hästi järgnevate NLP ülesannete täitmisel. Tõestame oma algoritmi teoreetilist privaatsustagatist ja hindame selle privaatsuse leket Membership Inference Attacks (MIA) all muudetud andmetega koolitatud mudelitel. Meie tulemused näitavad, et kavandatud mudel toimib paremini MIA rünnakute vastu, pakkudes samal ajal aluseks oleva transformatsiooniprotsessi kasulikkuse väiksemat või mitte mingit lagunemist võrreldes olemasolevate lähtejoontega.', 'fi': 'Yksityisyys on tärkeä huolenaihe, kun rakennetaan tilastotietoja sisältäviä tietoja koskevia malleja. Erityinen yksityisyys tarjoaa vahvan määritelmän yksityisyydelle, ja sitä voidaan käyttää useiden yksityisyyskysymysten ratkaisemiseen. Arkaluonteista tietoa sisältävien aineistojen erilaiseen yksityiseen muuntamiseen on ehdotettu useita ratkaisuja. Tällaiset muunnosalgoritmit tarjoavat kuitenkin huonoa hyötyä Natural Language Processing (NLP) -tehtävissä prosessiin lisätyn melun vuoksi. Tämä artikkeli käsittelee tätä ongelmaa tarjoamalla apuvälinettä säilyttävän erilaisesti yksityisen tekstin muunnosalgoritmin käyttäen automaattisia koodereita. Algoritmimme muuntaa tekstiä tarjotakseen kestävyyttä hyökkäyksiä vastaan ja tuottaa korkean semanttisen laadun muunnoksia, jotka toimivat hyvin jatkojalostuksen NLP-tehtävissä. Todistamme algoritmimme teoreettisen tietosuojatakuun ja arvioimme sen tietosuojavuodon Membership Inference Attacks (MIA) -kohdassa muunnelluilla tiedoilla koulutetuilla malleilla. Tuloksemme osoittavat, että ehdotettu malli suoriutuu paremmin MIA-hyökkäyksiä vastaan tarjoten samalla alemman tai olemattoman hajoamisen taustalla olevan muunnosprosessin hyödyllisyydessä verrattuna olemassa oleviin lähtölinjoihin.', 'ha': "Privacy is an important concern when building statistical models on data containing personal information.  Di da faransa dabam-daban, yana bãyar da fassarar mafiya ƙarfi ga faranta, kuma yana iya amfani da su sola masu husũma masu yawa na farauta. An goyya masu yawa wa jujjuya masu buƙata wa jujjuya masu buƙata da zane-ɗabi'a na danne-zane da ke ƙunsa da maɓalli na gane. A lokacin da, algoritori masu canza za'a zartar da amfani da shi a cikin aikin Taurar Lugha na Natural (NLP) saboda da sauri wanda aka ƙara cikin aikin nan. @ info Algorityinmu na musanya matsayin da za'a bãyar da ustawi kan akan attacki kuma yana sami musanya da nau'i mai kyakkyawan mutane da ke aiki na NLP. Tuna gaskata tabbatarwa na tamkar teori na algorityinmu kuma tuna karatunta farat ɗaya a ƙarƙashin Attacks na MIA (MIA) kan misãlai da aka sanar da shi da aka shige data. MatamayinMu na nũna cewa, misãlin da aka rufe shi ya sami mafiya alhẽri a kan attackoyin MIA a lokacin da ya ba da wani taƙaitacce wa amfani da amfani da aikin canza musanyawa a ƙarƙashin da aka sammeni da fassarar da wanda ke da shi.", 'sk': 'Zasebnost je pomembna skrb pri oblikovanju statističnih modelov na podatkih, ki vsebujejo osebne podatke. Diferencialna zasebnost ponuja močno opredelitev zasebnosti in jo je mogoče uporabiti za reševanje več vprašanj glede zasebnosti. Predlagane so bile več rešitev za diferencialno zasebno preoblikovanje naborov podatkov, ki vsebujejo občutljive informacije. Vendar pa takšni transformacijski algoritmi nudijo slabo uporabnost pri opravilih obdelave naravnega jezika (NLP) zaradi hrupa, dodanega v procesu. Ta prispevek obravnava to težavo z zagotavljanjem algoritma za diferencialno zasebno pretvorbo besedila, ki uporablja samodejno kodiranje. Naš algoritem preoblikuje besedilo, da ponuja robustnost proti napadom in ustvarja transformacije z visoko semantično kakovostjo, ki dobro delujejo pri opravilih NLP nadaljnjega toka. Dokazujemo teoretično jamstvo zasebnosti našega algoritma in ocenjujemo uhajanje zasebnosti v okviru napadov sklepanja članstva (MIA) na modelih, usposobljenih s preoblikovanimi podatki. Naši rezultati kažejo, da predlagani model deluje bolje proti napadom MIA, hkrati pa ponuja manjšo ali brez razgradnje uporabnosti osnovnega procesa transformacije v primerjavi z obstoječimi osnovnimi linijami.', 'bo': "མི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་སྒེར་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཡོད་པའི་ཚད་རྩིས་ཀྱི་མིག་ཆས་གསར་འཛུགས་པའི་སྐབས་སུ་གལ སྒེར་དབང་མི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཁྱད་དུ་འཕགས་པའི་མི་སྒེར་གྱི་ངོ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ངོ་ཚོའི་གཏན་བཤད་ནི་སྟོབས་ཤུགས་ཀྱི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལ དབྱིབས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྣ་མང་ཙམ་སྤྲོད་ཡོད་པ ཡིན་ནའང་། འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་གྲངས་སྒྲིག ཤོག་བྱང་འདི་གིས་འདི་དོན་དག་གི་སྤྱོད་ཆས་སྒེར་གྱི་ཡིག ང་ཚོའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག We prove our algorithm's theoretical privacy guarantee and assess its privacy leakage under Membership Inference Attacks (MIA) on models trained with transformed data. ང་ཚོའི་འབྲུག", 'he': 'פרטיות היא דאגה חשובה בניית מודלים סטטיסטיים על נתונים שמכילים מידע אישי. פרטיות שונה מציעה הגדרה חזקה של פרטיות ויכולה להשתמש כדי לפתור כמה דאגות פרטיות. הציעו מספר פתרונות לשינוי פרטי-דיפרנציאלי של קבוצות נתונים שמכילים מידע רגיש. עם זאת, אלגוריתמים שינויים כאלה מציעים שימוש גרוע בתפקידים של תהליך שפה טבעי (NLP) בגלל רעש שהוסיף בתהליך. הנייר הזה מתייחס לנושא הזה על ידי סיפק אלגוריתם שינוי טקסט פרטי ששומר שימושי שימוש בקודים אוטומטיים. האלגוריתם שלנו משנה טקסט כדי להציע חזקות נגד התקפות ומוצר שינויים עם איכות סמנטית גבוהה שמפקדים היטב במשימות NLP למטה. אנו מוכיחים את ההבטחה הפרטית התיאורית של האלגוריתם שלנו ולעריך את הדליפת הפרטיות שלה תחת התקפות אינפרנסיות חברות (MIA) על דוגמנים מאומנים עם נתונים משתנים. התוצאות שלנו מראות שהמודל המוצע מתבצע טוב יותר נגד התקפות MIA בזמן שהציעה נמוכה יותר ללא השפילה בתוך שימוש של תהליך השינוי בסיסי בהשוואה לקווים בסיסיים קיימים.', 'jv': 'Pribadi kuwi nggawe barang nggawe model dadi nang data sing berarti informasi pribadi. iCalImp section politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Perintah sing digawe nggawe akeh nggawe barang nggawe barang-sistem sing digawe batar algorit pribadi kanggo nggawe teks yang digawe auto-koder. Algorithmu anyar mbuh teks menyang tukang kanggo njuk sabên negoro atake sing berarti batar tentang karo perusahaan semanti kakaliter sing wis ana sing gagal bantuan NLP Awak dhéwé éndahé Algorithm kuwi nggawe perusahaan pribadi sing berarti karo nggawe perusahaan pribadi sing nganggo sistem membersance Info Attacks (MlA) nganggo model sing berarti dadi transformer Rejalaké awak dhéwé ngomong nik model sing gawe akeh luwih apik nyebute pernik atake MY iki dadi, nik awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe ngubah perusahaan kanggo ngubah perusahaan transformasi sing bakal terus maripé karo perusahaan sing bisa diagonalan tambah iki.'}
{'en': 'Evaluating Neural Model Robustness for Machine Comprehension', 'ar': 'تقييم متانة النموذج العصبي لفهم الآلة', 'pt': 'Avaliando a robustez do modelo neural para a compreensão da máquina', 'fr': 'Évaluation de la robustesse du modèle neuronal pour la compréhension des machines', 'es': 'Evaluación de la robustez del modelo neuronal para la comprensión de máquinas', 'ja': '機械理解のためのニューラルモデルの堅牢性の評価', 'zh': '评估以机器解神经模形鲁棒性', 'hi': 'मशीन समझ के लिए तंत्रिका मॉडल मजबूती का मूल्यांकन', 'ru': 'Оценка устойчивости нейронной модели для понимания машины', 'ga': 'Neart Múnla Néarach a Mheas le haghaidh Tuisceana Meaisín', 'ka': 'მაქინის კომპრენციისთვის ნეიროლური მოდელის პრობსტურება', 'hu': 'Neurális modell robusztusságának értékelése a gépek értékeléséhez', 'el': 'Αξιολόγηση της ανθεκτικότητας του νευρωνικού μοντέλου για την κατανόηση μηχανών', 'it': 'Valutazione della robustezza del modello neurale per la comprensione della macchina', 'mk': 'Оценување на силноста на нервниот модел за машинско разбирање', 'kk': 'Құрылғының нейрондық үлгісін бағалау', 'lt': 'Mašinos supratimo stiprumo neurologinio modelio vertinimas', 'mn': 'Машины шалгалтын мэдрэлийн загварын тодорхойлолт', 'no': 'Evaluerer nøyralmodellen Robustness for maskinekomprehensing', 'pl': 'Ocena wytrzymałości modelu neuronowego dla zrozumienia maszyn', 'ro': 'Evaluarea robusteții modelului neural pentru înțelegerea mașinilor', 'mt': 'Evalwazzjoni tar-Robustezza tal-Mudell Newrali għall-Komprensjoni tal-Magna', 'sr': 'Procjenjivanje Neuralnog modela robustnosti za kompresiju mašine', 'si': 'මැෂින් සම්ප්\u200dරේෂණය සඳහා න්\u200dයූරල් මොඩේල් විශ්වාස කරන්න', 'so': 'Qiimeynta dhaqdhaqaalaha naafada ee u baaraandegista mashiinka', 'sv': 'Utvärdering av robusthet i neural modell för maskinförståelse', 'ml': 'മെഷീന്\u200d പുതുക്കം ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള നെയുറല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d റോബസ്റ്റെന്റ് പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു', 'ms': 'Menghargai Kekuatan Model Neural untuk Pemahaman Mesin', 'ur': 'ماشین کمپرینس کے لئے نیورال موڈل روبروست کا ارزش کیا جاتا ہے', 'ta': 'இயந்திரத்தை முடிப்பதற்கான புதிய மாதிரி சுழற்சியை மதிப்பிடுகிறது', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đánh giá sức khỏe thần kinh cho máy tính', 'da': 'Evaluering af robusthed i neural model til maskinforståelse', 'bg': 'Оценка на здравината на невралния модел за разбиране на машината', 'id': 'Mengevaluasi Kekuatan Model Neural untuk Pemahaman Mesin', 'nl': 'Het beoordelen van de Robustheid van het Neurale Model voor Machine Comprehension', 'hr': 'Procjenjivanje Neuralnog modela robustnosti za kompresiju strojeva', 'de': 'Bewertung der Robustheit des neuronalen Modells für Maschinenverständnis', 'ko': '기계 이해의 신경 모형 노봉성 평가', 'fa': 'ارزیابی قابلیت مدل عصبی برای تجربه ماشین', 'af': 'Evalueer Neurale Model Robustness vir Masjienkomprehensie', 'sw': 'Kuthibitisha upatikanaji wa Modeli ya Njerumani kwa ajili ya Kupima Mashine', 'tr': 'Maşynyň sykylamasy üçin näyral nusga hili ýüklenýär', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Մեքենայի ընկալումների նյարդային մոդելի ուժեղության գնահատումը', 'bn': 'মেশিন সম্পুরণের জন্য নিউরেল মডেল রোবাস্টেন্স পরিমাপ করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': 'Evaluar la robustet del model neuronal per a la comprensió de la màquina', 'bs': 'Procjenjivanje Neuralnog modela robustnosti za kompresiju strojeva', 'sq': 'Evaluating Neural Model Robustness for Machine Comprehension', 'et': 'Neuraalse mudeli tugevuse hindamine masina mõistmiseks', 'fi': 'Neuromallin kestävyyden arviointi koneen ymmärtämiseksi', 'az': 'Maşın Kompresiyonu üçün nöral Modeli Robustness Assessment', 'cs': 'Hodnocení robustnosti neuronového modelu pro porozumění strojů', 'jv': 'Language', 'he': 'הערכה של חוזקת מודל נוירולי עבור הבנה של מכונות', 'sk': 'Ocena živčne robustnosti modela za razumevanje strojev', 'ha': 'Yana yin inganci game da Rubust na Model na Naural wa Compatinsa na Mashin', 'bo': 'མ་ལག་ཆེ་བསམ་པར་དབྱིབས་མ་དབྱིབས་རྩིས་བརྟན་བཟོས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ'}
{'en': 'We evaluate neural model robustness to adversarial attacks using different types of linguistic unit perturbations   character and word, and propose a new method for strategic sentence-level perturbations. We experiment with different amounts of perturbations to examine model confidence and misclassification rate, and contrast model performance with different embeddings BERT and ELMo on two benchmark datasets SQuAD and TriviaQA. We demonstrate how to improve model performance during an adversarial attack by using ensembles. Finally, we analyze factors that effect model behavior under adversarial attack, and develop a new model to predict errors during attacks. Our novel findings reveal that (a) unlike BERT, models that use ELMo embeddings are more susceptible to adversarial attacks, (b) unlike word and paraphrase, character perturbations affect the model the most but are most easily compensated for by adversarial training, (c) word perturbations lead to more high-confidence misclassifications compared to sentence- and character-level perturbations, (d) the type of question and model answer length (the longer the answer the more likely it is to be incorrect) is the most predictive of model errors in adversarial setting, and (e) conclusions about model behavior are dataset-specific.', 'ar': 'نقوم بتقييم قوة النموذج العصبي للهجمات العدائية باستخدام أنواع مختلفة من اضطرابات الوحدة اللغوية - الشخصية والكلمة ، ونقترح طريقة جديدة للاضطرابات الاستراتيجية على مستوى الجملة. نجرب كميات مختلفة من الاضطرابات لفحص معدل الثقة بالنموذج والتصنيف الخاطئ ، وأداء نموذج التباين مع عمليات التضمين المختلفة BERT و ELMo على مجموعتي بيانات معياريتين SQuAD و TriviaQA. نوضح كيفية تحسين أداء النموذج أثناء هجوم معادٍ باستخدام المجموعات. أخيرًا ، نقوم بتحليل العوامل التي تؤثر على سلوك النموذج تحت هجوم العداء ، ونطور نموذجًا جديدًا للتنبؤ بالأخطاء أثناء الهجمات. تكشف النتائج الجديدة التي توصلنا إليها أن (أ) على عكس BERT ، فإن النماذج التي تستخدم تطريز ELMo أكثر عرضة للهجمات العدائية ، (ب) على عكس الكلمات وإعادة الصياغة ، تؤثر اضطرابات الشخصية على النموذج أكثر من غيرها ولكن يتم تعويضها بسهولة عن طريق التدريب العدائي ، (ج) ) تؤدي اضطرابات الكلمات إلى مزيد من التصنيفات الخاطئة عالية الثقة مقارنة بالاضطرابات على مستوى الجملة والشخصية ، (د) نوع السؤال وطول إجابة النموذج (كلما طالت الإجابة زادت احتمالية أن تكون غير صحيحة) هي الأكثر تنبؤية لـ أخطاء النموذج في الإعداد العدائي ، و (هـ) الاستنتاجات حول سلوك النموذج خاصة بمجموعة البيانات.', 'es': 'Evaluamos la robustez del modelo neuronal ante los ataques adversarios utilizando diferentes tipos de perturbaciones de unidades lingüísticas (caracteres y palabras), y proponemos un nuevo método para las perturbaciones estratégicas a nivel de oración. Experimentamos con diferentes cantidades de perturbaciones para examinar la confianza del modelo y la tasa de clasificación incorrecta, y contrastamos el rendimiento del modelo con diferentes incorporaciones BERT y eLMO en dos conjuntos de datos de referencia sQuad y TriviAQA. Demostramos cómo mejorar el rendimiento del modelo durante un ataque de confrontación mediante el uso de conjuntos. Finalmente, analizamos los factores que afectan el comportamiento del modelo ante ataques adversarios y desarrollamos un nuevo modelo para predecir errores durante los ataques. Nuestros hallazgos novedosos revelan que (a) a diferencia de BERT, los modelos que utilizan incrustaciones de eLMO son más susceptibles a los ataques adversarios, (b) a diferencia de las palabras y la paráfrasis, las perturbaciones de los personajes afectan más al modelo, pero se compensan más fácilmente con el entrenamiento contradictorio, (c) las perturbaciones de palabras conducen a las clasificaciones erróneas de confianza en comparación con las perturbaciones a nivel de oración y carácter, (d) el tipo de pregunta y la longitud de la respuesta del modelo (cuanto más larga sea la respuesta, más probable es que sea incorrecta) es el más predictivo de los errores del modelo en el contexto contradictorio, y (e) las conclusiones sobre el comportamiento del modelo son conjuntos de datos específico.', 'fr': "Nous évaluons la robustesse du modèle neuronal face aux attaques contradictoires à l'aide de différents types de perturbations des unités linguistiques (caractère et mot), et proposons une nouvelle méthode pour les perturbations stratégiques au niveau de la phrase. Nous expérimentons différentes quantités de perturbations pour examiner la confiance du modèle et le taux d'erreur de classification, et nous comparons les performances du modèle avec différents intégrations BERT et ElMo sur deux ensembles de données de référence SQuad et TriviaQA. Nous montrons comment améliorer les performances du modèle lors d'une attaque contradictoire en utilisant des ensembles. Enfin, nous analysons les facteurs qui influent sur le comportement du modèle en cas d'attaque contradictoire et développons un nouveau modèle pour prédire les erreurs lors d'attaques. Nos nouvelles découvertes révèlent que (a) contrairement au BERT, les modèles qui utilisent des intégrations ElMo sont plus susceptibles aux attaques contradictoires, (b) contrairement aux mots et aux paraphrases, les perturbations des caractères affectent le modèle le plus mais sont plus facilement compensées par un entraînement contradictoire, (c) les perturbations des mots conduisent à des les erreurs de classification de confiance par rapport aux perturbations au niveau de la phrase et du caractère, (d) le type de question et la longueur de la réponse du modèle (plus la réponse est longue, plus elle est susceptible d'être incorrecte) est la plus prédictive des erreurs de modèle dans un contexte contradictoire, et (e) les conclusions sur le comportement du modèle sont spécifique.", 'pt': 'Avaliamos a robustez do modelo neural a ataques adversários usando diferentes tipos de perturbações de unidades linguísticas – caractere e palavra, e propomos um novo método para perturbações estratégicas em nível de sentença. Experimentamos diferentes quantidades de perturbações para examinar a confiança do modelo e a taxa de classificação incorreta, e o desempenho do modelo de contraste com diferentes embeddings BERT e ELMo em dois conjuntos de dados de referência SQuAD e TriviaQA. Demonstramos como melhorar o desempenho do modelo durante um ataque adversário usando conjuntos. Por fim, analisamos os fatores que afetam o comportamento do modelo sob ataque adversário e desenvolvemos um novo modelo para prever erros durante os ataques. Nossas novas descobertas revelam que (a) ao contrário do BERT, os modelos que usam embeddings ELMo são mais suscetíveis a ataques adversários, (b) ao contrário de palavras e paráfrases, as perturbações de caracteres afetam mais o modelo, mas são mais facilmente compensadas pelo treinamento adversário, (c ) as perturbações de palavras levam a mais erros de classificação de alta confiança em comparação com as perturbações de nível de sentença e caractere, (d) o tipo de pergunta e o comprimento da resposta do modelo (quanto mais longa a resposta, maior a probabilidade de estar incorreta) é o mais preditivo de erros de modelo em cenário adversário e (e) conclusões sobre o comportamento do modelo são específicas do conjunto de dados.', 'zh': '吾等以异类之言单元扰(字符与单词)评估神经模型对抗性攻之鲁棒性,并建一句扰动之法。 试其扰动,以验置信度误之率,两准集SQuAD与TriviaQA,比其性与不同者嵌BERTELMo。 吾将何以成对抗性攻而益之。 卒论对抗性之所以攻者,发一新以知其非也。 臣等新见明白,(a)与BERT不同,用ELMo嵌者易为对抗性攻,(b)与单词、释义不同,字符扰动对模型最大,然最易于训练以偿之,(c)比句字符级扰动,单词扰动致多者高置信度误类,(d)问与对案长短(答案愈长,愈可得也  非)者,对抗性置中最具预测性之非也,而(e)其论特定于数集也。', 'hi': 'हम विभिन्न प्रकार के भाषाई इकाई बाधाओं - चरित्र और शब्द का उपयोग करके प्रतिकूल हमलों के लिए तंत्रिका मॉडल मजबूती का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, और रणनीतिक वाक्य-स्तर की गड़बड़ी के लिए एक नई विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम मॉडल आत्मविश्वास और misclassification दर की जांच करने के लिए विभिन्न मात्रा में गड़बड़ी के साथ प्रयोग करते हैं, और दो बेंचमार्क डेटासेट SQuAD और TriviaQA पर विभिन्न एम्बेडिंग BERT और ELMo के साथ इसके विपरीत मॉडल प्रदर्शन। हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि ensembles का उपयोग करके एक प्रतिकूल हमले के दौरान मॉडल प्रदर्शन में सुधार कैसे करें। अंत में, हम उन कारकों का विश्लेषण करते हैं जो प्रतिकूल हमले के तहत मॉडल व्यवहार को प्रभावित करते हैं, और हमलों के दौरान त्रुटियों की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए एक नया मॉडल विकसित करते हैं। हमारे उपन्यास के निष्कर्षों से पता चलता है कि (ए) बर्ट के विपरीत, ईएलएमओ एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करने वाले मॉडल प्रतिकूल हमलों के लिए अधिक संवेदनशील होते हैं, (बी) शब्द और व्याख्या के विपरीत, चरित्र की गड़बड़ी मॉडल को सबसे अधिक प्रभावित करती है लेकिन सबसे आसानी से प्रतिकूल प्रशिक्षण द्वारा क्षतिपूर्ति की जाती है, (सी) शब्द की गड़बड़ी वाक्य की तुलना में अधिक उच्च-आत्मविश्वास गलत वर्गीकरण का कारण बनती है- और चरित्र-स्तर की गड़बड़ी, (डी) प्रश्न और मॉडल उत्तर लंबाई का प्रकार (जितना अधिक उत्तर उतना ही अधिक होने की संभावना है।  गलत) प्रतिकूल सेटिंग में मॉडल त्रुटियों का सबसे अधिक पूर्वानुमान है, और (ई) मॉडल व्यवहार के बारे में निष्कर्ष डेटासेट-विशिष्ट हैं।', 'ja': '私たちは、異なるタイプの言語単位の摂動（文字と単語）を使用して、対立攻撃に対するニューラルモデルの堅牢性を評価し、戦略的な文章レベルの摂動のための新しい方法を提案します。 異なる量の摂動を使用して、モデルの信頼性と誤分類率、および2つのベンチマークデータセットSQuADおよびTriviaQA上の異なるBERTおよびELMoの埋め込みによるコントラストモデルのパフォーマンスを検討します。 アンサンブルを使用して、対抗攻撃中にモデルのパフォーマンスを向上させる方法を実演します。 最後に、対抗攻撃下でモデルの動作に影響を与える要因を分析し、攻撃中のエラーを予測する新しいモデルを開発します。 私たちの新規の知見は、（ a ） BERTとは異なり、ELMo埋め込みを使用するモデルは、対抗攻撃の影響を受けやすいこと、（ b ）単語およびパラフレーズとは異なり、文字の摂動はモデルに最も影響を与えるが、対抗訓練によって最も容易に補償されること、（ c ）単語の摂動は、文章および文字レベルの摂動と比較して、より高い信頼性の誤分類をもたらすこと、（ d ）質問のタイプとモデルの回答の長さ（長いほど、不正確である可能性が高い）が、対抗設定におけるモデルエラーの最も予測可能であること、および（ e ）モデルの行動に関する結論は、データセット固有であることを明らかにします。', 'ru': 'Мы оцениваем устойчивость нейронной модели к соперническим атакам, используя различные типы возмущений лингвистических единиц – характер и слово, и предлагаем новый метод для стратегических возмущений на уровне предложений. Мы экспериментируем с разными количествами возмущений для изучения достоверности модели и частоты ошибочной классификации, а также производительности контрастной модели с разными вложениями BERT и ELMo на двух эталонных наборах данных SQuAD и TriviaQA. Мы демонстрируем, как улучшить производительность модели во время сопернической атаки с помощью ансамблей. Наконец, мы анализируем факторы, влияющие на поведение модели при сопернической атаке, и разрабатываем новую модель для прогнозирования ошибок во время атак. Наши новые выводы показывают, что (а) в отличие от БЕРТА, модели, которые используют вложения ELMo, более восприимчивы к атакам противника, (б) в отличие от слов и перефразов, возмущения персонажей влияют на модель больше всего, но наиболее легко компенсируются тренировкой противника, (в) возмущения слов приводят к более достоверным ошибочным классификациям по сравнению с возмущениями на уровне предложений и персонажей, (г) тип вопроса и длина ответа модели (чем дольше ответ, тем больше вероятность того, что он будет неверным) является наиболее прогнозируемым из ошибок модели в условиях соперника, и (д) выводы о поведении модели являются специфичными для набора данных.', 'ga': 'Déanaimid meastóireacht ar stóinseacht na samhla néaracha in aghaidh ionsaithe sáraíochta ag baint úsáide as cineálacha éagsúla suaitheadh aonad teangeolaíoch - carachtar agus focal, agus molaimid modh nua le haghaidh suaitheadh ar leibhéal na habairte. Déanaimid triail le méideanna éagsúla corraíl chun muinín sa tsamhail agus ráta mí-rangaithe a scrúdú, agus cuirimid feidhmíocht samhail i gcodarsnacht le leabaithe éagsúla BERT agus ELMo ar dhá thacar sonraí tagarmhairc SQuAD agus TriviaQA. Léirímid conas feidhmíocht samhail a fheabhsú le linn ionsaí sáraíochta trí úsáid a bhaint as ensembles. Ar deireadh, déanaimid anailís ar fhachtóirí a chuireann isteach ar iompar múnla faoi ionsaí sáraíochta, agus forbróimid múnla nua chun earráidí le linn ionsaithe a thuar. Léiríonn torthaí ár n-úrscéalta (a) murab ionann agus BERT, go bhfuil múnlaí a úsáideann leabaithe ELMo níos so-ghabhálaí d’ionsaithe sáraíochta, (b) murab ionann agus focal agus athinsint, is mó a mbíonn tionchar ag suaitheadh carachtair ar an tsamhail ach is furasta iad a chúiteamh le hoiliúint sháraíochta, (c). (d) an cineál ceiste agus samhailfhad freagartha (dá faide an freagra is ea is dóichí go bhfuil sé mícheart) an ceann is réamhaithrisí de earráidí samhaltaithe i socrú sáraíochta, agus (e) tá conclúidí faoi iompraíocht na samhla sainiúil don tacar sonraí.', 'hu': 'Az ellentétes támadásokkal szembeni idegi modellek robusztusságát különböző típusú nyelvi egység perturbációk - karakter és szó - segítségével értékeljük, és új módszert javasolunk a stratégiai mondatszintű perturbációkhoz. Különböző mértékű perturbációkkal kísérletezünk, hogy megvizsgáljuk a modell konfidenciáját és a hibás besorolási arányát, valamint a modell teljesítményét különböző beágyazásokkal BERT és ELMo két referenciaadatkészleten SQAD és TriviaQA. Bemutatjuk, hogyan javíthatjuk a modell teljesítményét ellenséges támadás során együttesek használatával. Végül elemezzük azokat a tényezőket, amelyek befolyásolják a modellviselkedést ellenséges támadások során, és kidolgozunk egy új modellt a támadások során felmerülő hibák előrejelzésére. Új eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy (a) a BERT-től eltérően az ELMo beágyazásokat használó modellek hajlamosabbak az ellenséges támadásokra, (b) a szóval és parafrázissal ellentétben a karakterek zavarásai a legjobban befolyásolják a modellt, de legkönnyebben ellensúlyozhatók ellenséges képzéssel, (c) a szózavarok nagyobb magabiztosságú tévesztésekhez vezetnek a mondat- és karakterszintű zavarásokhoz képest, (d) a kérdés típusa és a modell válasz hossza (minél hosszabb a válasz, annál valószínűbb, hogy helytelen) a modellhibák legelőrejelzőbb az ellentétes beállításokban, és (e) a modellviselkedésre vonatkozó következtetések adatkészletspecifikusak.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ნეიროლური მოდელის ძალიან ძალიან გავამუშავებთ განსაზღვრებული ატაკების გამოყენებაში განსხვავებული ტიპი ენგურისტიკური ერთეულის პერტუბრაციები - სიტყვა და სიტყვა, და ახალი მეთო ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტებით განსხვავებული პერტუბურაციების რაოდენობით მოდელის დარწმუნება და არასწორი კლასიფიკაციის სიჩქარე და კონტრონტურაციის მოდელის გამოყენება განსხვავებული კონტრონტურაციებით BERT ჩვენ მოვიდენსებთ როგორ მოდელური მუშაობას უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ ანალიზებთ ფაქტორები, რომლებიც მოდელური მონაცემების მონაცემების გარეშე, და ახალი მოდელური განვითარება, რომლებიც შეცდომების გარეშე ა ჩვენი პრომენტის შესაძლებლობები აღმოჩნენ, რომ a) BERT-ის განმავლობაში, მოდელები, რომელიც ELMo-ს გამოყენება, უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო მარტივია, მაგრამ უფრო ადვილედ უფრო უფრო უ d) კითხვის და მოდელური პასუხის სიგრძე (რამდენიმე სიგრძე პასუხი იქნება უფრო მარტივია) არის მოდელური შეცდომების ყველაზე წინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინა', 'it': "Valutiamo la robustezza del modello neurale agli attacchi avversi utilizzando diversi tipi di perturbazioni linguistiche - carattere e parola, e proponiamo un nuovo metodo per perturbazioni strategiche a livello di frase. Sperimentiamo diverse quantità di perturbazioni per esaminare la confidenza del modello e il tasso di errore di classificazione e contrastare le prestazioni del modello con incorporazioni BERT ed ELMo differenti su due set di dati benchmark SQUAD e TriviaQA. Dimostriamo come migliorare le prestazioni del modello durante un attacco avversario utilizzando ensemble. Infine, analizziamo i fattori che influenzano il comportamento del modello in caso di attacco avversario e sviluppiamo un nuovo modello per prevedere gli errori durante gli attacchi. I nostri nuovi risultati rivelano che (a) a differenza del BERT, i modelli che utilizzano incorporazioni ELMo sono più suscettibili agli attacchi avversi, (b) a differenza di parole e parafrasi, le perturbazioni dei caratteri influenzano il modello più ma sono più facilmente compensate dall'allenamento avversario, (c) le perturbazioni delle parole portano a più errori di classificazione ad alta fiducia rispetto alle perturbazioni a livello di frase e carattere, (d) il tipo di domanda e la lunghezza della risposta del modello (più lunga è la risposta, più è probabile che sia errata) è il più predittivo degli errori del modello nell'impostazione avversaria, e (e) le conclusioni sul comportamento del modello sono specifiche per set di dati.", 'kk': 'Біз невралдық үлгісін қарсы қарсы қалдыруды түрлі лингвистикалық бірліктердің түрлері - таңбалар мен сөз, және стратегикалық сөз деңгейіндегі қалдырудың жаңа әдісін қолданамыз. Біз үлгі сенімділік және қарамастыру жиілігін тексеру үшін әртүрлі түрлі аурулармен тәжірибелеміз, әртүрлі BERT және ELMo бағдарламалардың екі бағдарламалық деректер жиілігін SQuAD және TriviaQA бағдарла Біз енземблерді қолдану үшін қалай жақсы жасау үлгісін көрсетедік. Соңында біз қателерді бақылау үшін қателерді алдын алау үшін жаңа үлгісін анализирақ. Біздің романдық табуларымыз: a) BERT сияқты, ELMo ендіру үлгілерін қолданатын үлгілер негізгі қарсылыққа арналған, b) сөз мен парфраз сияқты, таңбалардың қарсылығы үлгіге ең жақсы әсер етеді, бірақ қарсылық оқытуға арналған, c) сөздердің қарсылығы сөздердің қарсылығымен қарсылыққа ар d) сұрақ және үлгі жауаптың ұзындығы (жауап дұрыс болуы мүмкін) қарсылық параметрлерінің үлгі қателердің ең ұзындығы, және e) үлгі әрекеттер туралы шелтемелер - деректер жиынының нақты қателері.', 'lt': 'Vertiname neurologinio modelio stiprumą priešingoms priepuoliams naudojant įvairių tipų kalbinių vienetų perturbacijas - charakterį ir žodį, ir siūlome naują strateginių sakinių lygio perturbacijų metodą. Eksperimentuojame su skirtingais perturbacijų kiekiais, kad išnagrinėtume modelio pasitikėjimą ir klaidingą klasifikavimo greitį ir kontrastinį modelio veiksmingumą su skirtingais BERT ir ELMo įdėjimais dviejuose lyginamuosiuose SQuAD ir TriviaQA duomenų rinkiniuose. Mes parodysime, kaip pagerinti modelio rezultatus priešingo išpuolio metu naudojant ansamblius. Galiausiai analizuojame veiksnius, kurie veikia modelio elgesį priešiško išpuolio metu, ir kuriame naują model į klaidų prognozavimui išpuolių metu. Mūsų nauji rezultatai rodo, kad a) priešingai nei BERT, modeliai, naudojantys ELMo įdėjimus, yra labiau jautrūs priešingoms atakoms, b) priešingai nei žodžiai ir parafrazės, charakterių sutrikimai labiausiai veikia model į, bet lengviausiai kompensuojami priešingomis mokymomis, c) žodžių sutrikimai sukelia didesnį pasitikėjimą klaidinančius klasifikavimus, palyginti su sakinių ir charakterių sutrikimais,  (d) the type of question and model answer length (the longer the answer the more likely it is to be incorrect) is the most predictive of model errors in adversarial setting, and (e) conclusions about model behavior are dataset-specific.', 'mk': 'We evaluate neural model robustness to adversarial attacks using different types of linguistic unit perturbations - character and word, and propose a new method for strategic sentence-level perturbations.  We experiment with different amounts of perturbations to examine model confidence and misclassification rate, and contrast model performance with different embeddings BERT and ELMo on two benchmark datasets SQuAD and TriviaQA.  Демонстрираме како да ги подобриме моделите за време на противниот напад со користење ансембли. Конечно, ги анализираме факторите кои влијаат на однесувањето на моделот под непријателски напад, и развиваме нов модел за предвидување на грешките за време на нападите. Нашите нови откритија откриваат дека (a) за разлика од БЕРТ, моделите кои користат вложувања на ЕЛМО се почувствителни на непријателски напади, (b) за разлика од зборот и парафразата, пертурбирањата на карактеристиката најмногу влијаат на моделот, но најлесно се компензирани со непријателска обука, (c) зборовите пертурбирањата водат до поголема класификација на доверба во според (d) типот на прашање и должината на одговорот на моделот (колку подолго е одговорот толку повеќе е веројатно дека ќе биде неправилен) е најпредвидливиот од грешките на моделот во непријателското поставување, и (e) заклучоците за однесувањето на моделот се специфични за податоците.', 'el': 'Αξιολογούμε την ανθεκτικότητα του νευρικού μοντέλου σε αντίπαλες επιθέσεις χρησιμοποιώντας διαφορετικούς τύπους διαταραχών γλωσσικής μονάδας χαρακτήρα και λέξης, και προτείνουμε μια νέα μέθοδο για στρατηγικές διαταραχές επιπέδου προτάσεων. Πειραματιζόμαστε με διαφορετικά ποσά διαταραχών για να εξετάσουμε την εμπιστοσύνη του μοντέλου και το ποσοστό λανθασμένης ταξινόμησης, καθώς και την απόδοση του μοντέλου αντίθεσης με διαφορετικές ενσωματώσεις BERT και ELMo σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς SQuAD και TriviaQA. Επιδεικνύουμε πώς να βελτιώσουμε την απόδοση του μοντέλου κατά τη διάρκεια μιας αντίπαλης επίθεσης χρησιμοποιώντας σύνολα. Τέλος, αναλύουμε παράγοντες που επηρεάζουν τη συμπεριφορά του μοντέλου υπό αντίπαλη επίθεση και αναπτύσσουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο για την πρόβλεψη σφαλμάτων κατά τη διάρκεια των επιθέσεων. Τα νέα ευρήματά μας αποκαλύπτουν ότι (α) σε αντίθεση με το BERT, τα μοντέλα που χρησιμοποιούν ενσωμάτωση ELMo είναι πιο ευαίσθητα σε αντίπαλες επιθέσεις, (β) σε αντίθεση με τη λέξη και την παραφράση, οι διαταραχές χαρακτήρων επηρεάζουν το μοντέλο περισσότερο, αλλά αντισταθμίζονται ευκολότερα με αντίπαλη εκπαίδευση, (γ) οι διαταραχές λέξεων οδηγούν σε περισσότερες λανθασμένες ταξινομήσεις υψηλής εμπιστοσύνης σε σύγκριση με διαταραχές σε επίπεδο προτάσεων και χαρακτήρων, (δ) ο τύπος της ερώτησης και το μήκος της απάντησης του μοντέλου (όσο μεγαλύτερη είναι η απάντηση τόσο πιο πιθανό είναι να είναι εσφαλμένη) είναι το πιο προβλέψιμο των σφαλμάτων του μοντέλου σε αντιπαραθέσεις, και (ε) τα συμπεράσματα σχετικά με τη συμπεριφορά του μοντέλου είναι ειδικά για το σύνολο δεδομένων.', 'mt': 'Aħna jevalwaw ir-robustezza tal-mudell newrali għall-attakki avversarji bl-użu ta’ tipi differenti ta’ perturbazzjonijiet tal-unit à lingwistika - karattru u kelma, u nipproponu metodu ġdid għal perturbazzjonijiet strateġiċi fil-livell tas-sentenza. Aħna ninsperimentaw b’ammonti differenti ta’ perturbazzjonijiet biex jeżaminaw il-mudell ta’ fiduċja u r-rata ta’ klassifikazzjoni ħażina, u l-prestazzjoni tal-mudell ta’ kuntrast ma’ inkorporazzjonijiet differenti BERT u ELMo fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ referenza SQuAD u TriviaQA. Aħna nuru kif nistgħu ntejbu l-prestazzjoni tal-mudell matul attakk avversarju billi nużaw ensembles. Fl-a ħħar nett, nagħmlu analiżi tal-fatturi li jaffettwaw l-imġiba tal-mudell taħt attakk avversarju, u niżviluppaw mudell ġdid li jipprevedi żbalji matul l-attakki. Our novel findings reveal that (a) unlike BERT, models that use ELMo embeddings are more susceptible to adversarial attacks, (b) unlike word and paraphrase, character perturbations affect the model the most but are most easily compensated for by adversarial training, (c) word perturbations lead to more high-confidence misclassifications compared to sentence- and character-level perturbations, (d) it-tip ta’ mistoqsija u t-tul tat-tweġiba tal-mudell (aktar tkun itwal it-tweġiba aktar probabbli li tkun inkorretta) huwa l-aktar żbalji tal-mudell prevedibbli fl-isfond avversarju, u (e) il-konklużjonijiet dwar l-imġiba tal-mudell huma speċifiċi għal sett ta’ dejta.', 'mn': 'Бид мэдрэлийн загварын хүчтэй байдлыг өөр төрлийн хэл хэлний нэгжүүдийн эсрэг дайралтуудын тулд үнэлдэг. Бид өөр төрлийн хэлбэрүүдийн эсрэг дайралтуудын тулд өөр хэлбэрүүдийг ашиглаж, хариу, үг, страте Бид загварын итгэл үнэмшил, буруу хэлбэрийг шалгахын тулд өөр хэмжээний шалгалттай туршилт хийдэг. БЕРТ болон ЕЛМО хоёр салбарын өгөгдлийн сан SQuAD болон TriviaQA хоёр давхар давхар загварын үйл ажиллагааг шалгаж Бид эсрэг халдварын үед загварын үйл ажиллагааг хэрхэн сайжруулах вэ гэдгийг харуулж байна. Эцэст нь бид эсрэг халдварын дотор загварын үйл явцыг нөлөөлж буй хүчин зүйлсийг шинжилгээ хийж, халдварын үед алдаа таамаглахын тулд шинэ загвар бүтээж байна. Бидний шинэ соёл олсон зүйлс нь (a) БЕРТ-тай адил, ELMo-ын загварыг ашигладаг загварууд нь эсрэг атлаас илүү хүндрэлтэй, b) үг болон параграас ялгаагүй, хариу үйлдвэрлэл нь загварын хамгийн амархан нөлөөлдөг, гэхдээ эсрэг сургалтын тулд хамгийн амархан төлөвлөгдөж, c) үг үйлдвэрлэл нь өгүүлбэр,  d) асуулт болон загварын хариултын урт (хариулт нь буруу байх боломжтой ихэнхдээ илүү урт) бол эсрэг загварын алдаа загварын хамгийн тодорхойлолтой, мөн (e) загварын үйл явцын тухай тодорхойлолт нь өгөгдлийн сангийн тодорхойлолтой.', 'no': 'Vi evaluerer neuralmodellen kraftighet til adversariske attackar med forskjellige typar lingviske einingar - teikn og ord, og foreslår ein ny metode for strategiske setningsnivå. Vi eksperimenterer med forskjellige mengdar perturbasjonar for å undersøke modellen av tiltrudd og feilklassifikasjonsfart, og kontrastmodellen med forskjellige innbygging BERT og ELMo på to benchmarkdatasett SQuAD og TriviaQA. Vi viser korleis modellen skal forbetra utviklingar under ein adversarisk attack ved å bruka ensembler. I slutt analyserer vi faktorer som gjer effektmodellen under negativ bruk, og utviklar ein ny modell for å foregå feil under attackar. Noverande finningane våre viser at (a) ulik BERT, er modeller som brukar ELMo-innbygging meir mottakar, b) ulik ord og parafrase, teiknsturbasjonar påvirkar modellen det meste, men er mest enkelt kompensert for ved adversariske opplæring, c) ordopplæringar fører til meir feilklassifikasjonar med høg tillit sammenlignet med setningsnivå og karakternivå, d) kva type spørsmål og model svarlengde (så lenge svaret er mest sannsynleg at det er feil) er den mest foregåand e av modellefeil i negativinnstillingane, og e) konklusjonar om modelleoppførsel er datasettspesifikke.', 'pl': 'Oceniamy solidność modelu neuronowego na ataki przeciwne przy użyciu różnych typów zakłóceń jednostek językowych charakteru i słowa oraz proponujemy nową metodę zakłóceń strategicznych na poziomie zdań. Eksperymentujemy z różnymi ilościami zakłóceń, aby zbadać zaufanie modelu i szybkość błędnej klasyfikacji oraz wydajność modelu kontrastowego z różnymi osadzeniami BERT i ELMo na dwóch zestawach danych referencyjnych SQuAD i TriviaQA. Pokazujemy, jak poprawić wydajność modelu podczas ataku przeciwnika za pomocą zespołów. Na koniec analizujemy czynniki wpływające na zachowanie modelu pod atakiem przeciwników oraz opracowujemy nowy model przewidywania błędów podczas ataków. Nasze nowe ustalenia ujawniają, że (a) w przeciwieństwie do BERT, modele wykorzystujące osadzenia ELMo są bardziej podatne na ataki przeciwne, (b) w przeciwieństwie do słowa i parafrazy, zakłócenia znaków wpływają na model najbardziej, ale są najłatwiej rekompensowane przez trening przeciwny, (c) zakłócenia słowa prowadzą do większych błędów pewności siebie w porównaniu z zakłóceniami na poziomie zdań i znaków, (d) rodzaj pytania i długość odpowiedzi modelu (im dłuższa odpowiedź, tym bardziej prawdopodobne jest, że będzie ona nieprawidłowa) jest najbardziej predykcyjnym błędem modelu w ustawieniach przeciwnych, a (e) wnioski dotyczące zachowania modelu są specyficzne dla zbioru danych.', 'ms': 'Kami menilai kekuatan model saraf untuk serangan musuh menggunakan jenis berbeza perturbasi unit bahasa - aksara dan kata, dan melamar kaedah baru untuk perturbasi peringkat kalimat strategik. Kami eksperimen dengan jumlah perturbasi yang berbeza untuk memeriksa kepercayaan model dan kadar klasifikasi salah, dan prestasi model bertentangan dengan bentuk BERT dan ELMo berbeza pada dua set data benchmark SQuAD dan TriviaQA. Kami menunjukkan bagaimana untuk memperbaiki prestasi model semasa serangan musuh dengan menggunakan ensembles. Akhirnya, kami menganalisis faktor yang mempengaruhi perilaku model di bawah serangan musuh, dan mengembangkan model baru untuk meramalkan ralat semasa serangan. Our novel findings reveal that (a) unlike BERT, models that use ELMo embeddings are more susceptible to adversarial attacks, (b) unlike word and paraphrase, character perturbations affect the model the most but are most easily compensated for by adversarial training, (c) word perturbations lead to more high-confidence misclassifications compared to sentence- and character-level perturbations, (d) jenis soalan dan panjang jawapan model (semakin panjang jawapan semakin kemungkinan ia adalah salah) adalah ralat model yang paling ramai dalam tetapan musuh, dan (e) kesimpulan mengenai perilaku model adalah spesifik-set data.', 'ml': 'We evaluate neural model robustness to adversarial attacks using different types of linguistic unit perturbations - character and word, and propose a new method for strategic sentence-level perturbations.  മോഡലിന്റെ വിശ്വാസവും തെറ്റായ വിഭാഗവും പരിശോധിക്കാനും, വ്യത്യസ്തമായ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശനവും ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയും എല്\u200dമോയും രണ്ട് ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d SQu ഒരു എതിരാളിയായ ആക്രമണത്തില്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d പ്രകടനം മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് എങ്ങനെയാണെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു തര അവസാനം, നമ്മള്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d നടപടികളെ അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. എതിരാളിയായ ആക്രമണത്തിന്\u200dറെ കീഴില്\u200d പ്രഭാവിക്കുന്നു. ആക്രമണങ്ങളില്\u200d പിശ നമ്മുടെ നോവല്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടികള്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നു (a) പോലെയുള്ള ബെര്\u200dട്ടിംഗ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d എതിരാളികളായ ആക്രമണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d സംശയിക്കുന്നു (b) വാക്കും പാരാഫ്രേഷനും തുല്യമായ വാക്കുകളും മോഡലിന് ഏറ്റവും മിക് (d) ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെയും മോഡലിന്റെയും ഉത്തരമുള്ള ഉത്തരം നീളം (അതിന്റെ ഉത്തരം തെറ്റായിരിക്കുന്നേടത്തോളം) എതിരാളികളായ ക്രമീകരണത്തില്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d പിശകുകളുട', 'ro': 'Evaluăm robustețea modelului neural la atacurile adversare folosind diferite tipuri de perturbări ale unităților lingvistice - caracter și cuvânt, și propunem o nouă metodă pentru perturbările strategice la nivel de propoziții. Experimentăm cu diferite cantități de perturbări pentru a examina încrederea modelului și rata de eroare a clasificării și pentru a contrasta performanța modelului cu diferite încorporări BERT și ELMo pe două seturi de date de referință SQUAD și TriviaQA. Vă demonstrăm cum să îmbunătățiți performanța modelului în timpul unui atac adversar folosind ansambluri. În cele din urmă, analizăm factorii care influențează comportamentul modelului în cazul atacurilor adversare și dezvoltăm un nou model pentru a prezice erorile în timpul atacurilor. Noile noastre constatări arată că (a) spre deosebire de BERT, modelele care utilizează încorporări ELMo sunt mai susceptibile la atacuri adversare, (b) spre deosebire de cuvinte și parafrază, perturbările caracterului afectează modelul cel mai mult, dar sunt cel mai ușor compensate de antrenament adversar, (c) perturbările cuvintelor duc la mai multe erori de încredere în comparație cu perturbările la nivel de frază și caracter, (d) tipul de întrebare și lungimea răspunsului modelului (cu cât răspunsul este mai lung, cu atât este mai probabil să fie incorect) este cea mai predictivă a erorilor modelului în setarea adversară, iar (e) concluziile privind comportamentul modelului sunt specifice setului de date.', 'so': "Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa dabeecadaha neurada ee weerarka cadaawayaasha ah oo isticmaalaya noocyo kala duduwan oo luuqadaha ah - xaraf iyo hadal, waxaana soo bandhigaynaa qaab cusub oo ku saabsan heerka saxda. Waxaan imtixaamaynaa qalabka kala duduwan si aan u baarito kalsoonaanta sameynta iyo fasaxa kalsoonaanta sameynta sameynta modellka oo kala duduwan BERT iyo ELMo oo ku qoran labada koonfureed SQuAD iyo TriviaQA. We demonstrate how to improve model performance during an adversarial attack by using ensembles.  Ugu dambaysta, waxaynu analyshannaa falimaha modellka oo ku saabsan dabeecada ka geesta ah, waxaana horumarinaynaa model cusub si aan ugu sii sheegno qaladyada marka lagu weeraro. Shaqooyinkayada dhamaanka ah waxay muuqataa (a) si u eg BERT, modellada isticmaalaya ELMo ka mid ah ay ka shakidaan dagaalladaha cadaawayaasha, (b) hadal u eg iyo hadal kaleba ah, isku xiriirka ku saabsan tusaalka ugu wada sahlan, laakiin waxaa ugu fudud u magdhaw waxbarashada cadaawayaasha ah, (c) baaritaanka kalsoonaanta ayaa ka dhiga dhibaatooyin badan oo la barbardhigay qoraalka- iyo xarafka-heerka, (d) Midabka su'aalka iyo dhererka jawaabta modellka (inta ka badan jawaabta suurtowda inay khalad tahay) waa mid ugu sii hor dhigi kara qaladyada modellka e e ka gees ah, iyo (e) dhamaadka dabeecada modellka waa macluumaad gaar ah.", 'ta': 'நாம் வேறு வகையான மொழிமாற்றங்களை பயன்படுத்தி பிரிவான தோற்றங்களுக்கு பாதுகாப்பு மாதிரி மாதிரியை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் - எழுத்து மற்றும் சொல்லை, த We experiment with different amounts of perturbations to examine model confidence and misclassification rate, and contrast model performance with different embeddings BERT and ELMo on two benchmark datasets SQuAD and TriviaQA.  நாம் எப்படி மாதிரி செயல்பாட்டை மேம்படுத்த முடியும் என்பதை காண்பிக்கிறோம் எதிர்பார்வை தாக்கும்  இறுதியில், நாம் மாதிரி நடத்தையை பாதிக்கும் போது விளைவாக்கும் காரணங்களை ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம், மற்றும் தாக்கும் போத எங்கள் புதிய கண்டுபிடிப்புகள் தெரிவிக்கின்றன, ELMo பொருள்களை பயன்படுத்தும் மாதிரிகள் எதிர்பார்வைகளுக்கு சந்தேகமாக இருக்கின்றன, (b) வார்த்தையும் அளபுரையும் ஒப்பிட்டால், எழுத்துக்கள் மாதிரியை மிகவும் எளிதாக பா (d) கேள்வி மற்றும் மாதிரி விடை நீளத்தின் வகை (அதிகமாக அது தவறாக இருக்கும் என்று பதில்) மாதிரி பிழைகளில் மிக முன்காட்டியாகும், மாதிரி நடத்தைப் பற்றிய முடிவ', 'si': 'අපි වෙනස් භාෂාවික යුනිට් වර්ගයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වෙනස් වර්ගයක් සහ භාෂාවික වර්ගයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා - අක්ෂර සහ වචන, සහ අ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා වෙනස් විශ්වාස සහ විශ්වාස විශ්වාස විශ්වාස විශ්වාස විශ්වාස කරන්න, සහ වෙනස් ඇම්බෙන්ඩින්ග් වල BERT සහ ELMo විශේෂ අපි ප්\u200dරදර්ශනය කරනවා කොහොමද ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වැඩ කරන්නේ විරෝධිය ප්\u200dරහාරයක් වෙනුවෙන් විරෝධ වෙ අන්තිමේදී, අපි විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා විරෝධ විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා විරෝධ විදිහට පරික්ෂා කරනව අපේ ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණයක් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට (a) අනිවාර්ය BERT, මොඩේල් එක භාවිතා ELMo Embdings are more susceptive to adversarial Attacks, (b) අනිවාර්ය වචනය සහ පැරච්චාරයක්, character pertubation affects the Model the more but are more readly compensed for by adversarial Training, (c) word pertubation (d) ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ මන්ඩල් උත්තර දිගාව (තරම් වැඩි උත්තර සමහරවිට ඒක වැරැද්දක් වෙන්න පුළුවන්) ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ මන්ඩල් උත්තර දිගාව) විරෝධ වැර', 'sr': 'Procjenjujemo neuralnu modelu jačinu neprijateljskim napadima koristeći različite vrste perturbacije lingvističke jedinice - karakter i reč, i predlažemo novu metodu za perturbacije na nivou strateške rečenice. Eksperimentiramo sa različitim količinama perturbacija kako bi pregledali model poverenja i pogrešnu klasifikaciju, i kontrastirali model izvedbe sa različitim integracijama BERT i ELMo na dva standardna seta podataka SQuAD i TriviaQA. Pokazujemo kako da poboljšamo modelnu funkciju tokom neprijateljskog napada koristeći ensemble. Napokon, analiziramo faktore koji utiču na model pod neprijateljski napad i razvijamo novi model da predvidimo greške tokom napada. Naši novi nalazi otkrivaju da (a) za razliku od BERT, modeli koji koriste uključenje ELMo su osjetljiviji protiv neprijateljskih napada, b) za razliku od riječi i parafraze, perturbacije karaktera utiču na model najveći, ali su najlakše kompenzirani protivničkim treningama, c) perturbacije riječi dovele do visoke pogrešne klasifikacije povjerenja u usporedbu sa perturbacijama rečenica i nivoa karaktera, d) vrsta pitanja i model dužin e odgovora (što je duže odgovor vjerojatnije da je nepravednije) je najpredvidljivija modelnih grešaka u neprijateljskom postavljanju, a e) zaključki o modelnom ponašanju su specifični podaci.', 'sv': 'Vi utvärderar den neurala modellens robusthet mot motståndareliga attacker med hjälp av olika typer av språkliga enhetsstörningar - tecken och ord, och föreslår en ny metod för strategiska meningsnivåstörningar. Vi experimenterar med olika mängder störningar för att undersöka modellkonfidens och felklassificeringsfrekvens samt kontrastera modellprestanda med olika inbäddningar BERT och ELMo på två benchmarkdatauppsättningar SQUAD och TriviaQA. Vi demonstrerar hur man kan förbättra modellprestandan under en fientlig attack med hjälp av ensembler. Slutligen analyserar vi faktorer som påverkar modellbeteenden vid motpartsattacker och utvecklar en ny modell för att förutsäga fel vid attacker. Våra nya fynd visar att (a) till skillnad från BERT, modeller som använder ELMo-inbäddningar är mer mottagliga för fientliga attacker, (b) till skillnad från ord och parafras påverkar teckenstörningar modellen mest men lättast kompenseras av fientlig träning, (c) ordstörningar leder till mer konfidentiella missklassificeringar jämfört med menings- och karaktärsstörningar, (d) Typ av fråga och modellsvarslängd (ju längre svaret är desto mer sannolikt att det är felaktigt) är den mest förutsägbara av modellfel i motsats inställning, och (e) slutsatser om modellbeteende är dataspecifika.', 'ur': 'ہم نئورل موڈل مضبوطی کا ارزش کرتے ہیں مختلف زبان یونیٹ کی مختلف طریقوں کے مطابق مختلف طریقوں کے مطابق مختلف طریقوں کے ذریعہ، شخصت اور کلمات، اور استراتژیک کلمات-سطح کی مخالفت کے لئے ایک نوی طریقہ پیش کرتے ہم مختلف اندازوں کے ساتھ آزمائش کررہے ہیں کہ موڈل کی اطمینان اور غلط کلاسپی رات کی آزمائش کریں اور مختلف موڈل کی آزمائش کریں BERT اور ELMo کے ساتھ دو بینچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ SQuAD اور TriviaQA پر ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ایک مخالف حملہ کے وقت موڈل کی عملکرد کس طرح اضافہ کریں۔ آخر میں ہم نے فکتوروں کو تحقیق کر لیا ہے جن کی موڈل اثر مخالف حملہ کے ذریعے ہے اور ایک نئی موڈل کو تغییر دینے کے لئے تغییر دینے کے لئے۔ ہماری روانی اثبات ظاہر کرتی ہیں کہ (a) BERT کے بغیر، نمونے جو ELMo انڈینگ استعمال کرتے ہیں ان سے زیادہ مخالف حملہ کے ساتھ مضبوط ہیں, (b) کلمات اور پارافریز کے بغیر مخالف ہیں، شخصت مضبوطی موڈل کو زیادہ اثر دیتی ہیں لیکن ان سے زیادہ آسان مضبوطی تطالب کی وجہ سے مضبوطی کی جاتی ہیں, (c) کلمات مضبوطی مضبوطی کے مطا (d) سؤال اور نمڈل کی مدت (اس سے زیادہ زیادہ زیادہ ممکن ہے کہ یہ غلط ہو) مقابلہ مقابلہ میں مدل کی خطاؤں کی سب سے زیادہ پیش بینی ہے، اور (e) نمڈل رفتار کے بارے میں نتیجے ہیں، ڈاٹ سٹ کے مقابلہ میں.', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đánh giá khả năng của mô hình thần kinh đối đầu với các vụ tấn công bằng cách sử dụng các dạng khác nhau của các tổ chức lo ngại ngôn ngữ và chữ, và đề xuất phương pháp mới cho các lo ngại về mức án chiến lược. Chúng tôi thử nghiệm với lượng bất động sản khác nhau để kiểm tra độ tin tưởng và phân hạng của mô hình, và khả năng tương phản với sự tác hợp khác nhau của BERT và ElMo trên hai tập tin mẫu tiêu chuẩn SQurAD và TriviaQA. Chúng tôi chứng minh cách nâng cao khả năng của mô hình trong cuộc tấn công đối nghịch bằng dàn nhạc. Sau cùng, chúng tôi phân tích các yếu tố hiệu quả hành vi mô hình khi đối nghịch tấn công, và phát triển một mô hình mới để dự đoán sai lầm trong các cuộc tấn công. Những phát hiện mới trong tiểu thuyết c ủa chúng ta cho thấy rằng: a) không như BERT, những mô hình dùng sự nhúng tay ElMo càng dễ b ị ảnh hưởng bởi những rủi ro cao hơn so với những câu nói và cách diễn giải, sự bất đồng nhân cách gây ảnh hưởng nhiều nhất đến mô hình, nhưng dễ dàng được bù đắp bởi sự huấn luyện chống đối, và) Những phiền phức từ gây tin cao hơn là sai sót so với những phiền to ái ở mức án và tính cách, (d) kiểu câu hỏi và câu trả lời kiểu mẫu (thì câu trả lời d ài hơn nhiều thì khả năng nó sai) là sai sót dự đoán nhiều nhất của lỗi mô hình trong môi trường đối nghịch, và (e) kết luận về hành vi mô hình là quy định sẵn dữ liệu.', 'uz': "Biz har xil turlari - harf va so'z bilan bir xil turlarini ishlatish uchun neyrolik model robustiyasini qiymatimiz, va strategik gaplarning darajasini o'zgartirish uchun yangi usulni o'ylaymiz. Biz modelning muammolari va xatolarning darajasini ko'rib chiqarish uchun boshqa tajribalarni o'rganamiz, va boshqa model bajarishni BERT va ELMo bilan ikkita benchmark maʼlumotlarni SQuAD va TriviaQA ta'minlovchimiz. Biz foydalanuvchi shamol bilan foydalanishda model amalni bajarishni ko'rsatdik. Oxirgi, biz taqdimot qilishda model xuddi bajariladigan narsalarni analyzeriz, va harakatlarda xatolarni koʻrsatish uchun yangi modelni tahlil qilamiz. Bizning novel muvaffaqiyatlarimiz bilan BERT kabi modellar, ELMo ishlatilgan modellar taqdim qilishdan foydalanadi, (b) taqdim so'z va paraphraslarga o'xshash so'z va shakllar modelga qo'llaniladi, lekin taʼminlovchi taʼminot yordamida juda oson bo'ladi, (c) so'zlar taʼminlovchilar gapiradigan so'zlar va harf darajada ko'proq muammolar bo'ladi, (d) Soʻrov va model javob uzunligi (qancha javob notoʻgʻri boʻlishi kerak boʻlganda uzunligi) motel moslamadagi eng chegara notoʻgʻri, va model xususiyatlarining natijalari - maʼlumotset- specific.", 'da': 'Vi evaluerer neurale models robusthed over for adversielle angreb ved hjælp af forskellige typer sproglige enhedsforstyrrelser - tegn og ord, og foreslår en ny metode til strategiske forstyrrelser på sætningsniveau. Vi eksperimenterer med forskellige mængder forstyrrelser for at undersøge modellens tillid og fejlklassificeringshastighed og kontrastere modellens ydeevne med forskellige indlejringer BERT og ELMo på to benchmark datasæt SQUAD og TriviaQA. Vi demonstrerer, hvordan man kan forbedre modellens ydeevne under et modstridende angreb ved hjælp af ensembler. Endelig analyserer vi faktorer, der påvirker model adfærd under adversarial angreb, og udvikler en ny model til at forudsige fejl under angreb. Vores nye resultater viser, at (a) i modsætning til BERT, modeller, der bruger ELMo-indlejringer, er mere modtagelige for modstandsdygtige angreb, (b) i modsætning til ord og parafrase påvirker karakterforstyrrelser modellen mest, men er lettest kompenseret af modstandsdygtig træning, (c) ordforstyrrelser fører til flere høj tillidsforkerte klassificeringer sammenlignet med sætnings- og karakterniveauforstyrrelser, (d) typen af spørgsmål og modelsvarets længde (jo længere svaret er, jo mere sandsynligt er det, at det er forkert) er den mest forudsigende af modelfejl i modstridende indstillinger, og (e) konklusioner om modelsadfærd er datasætsspecifikke.', 'nl': 'We evalueren de robuustheid van het neurale model tegen tegenstrijdige aanvallen met behulp van verschillende soorten taalkundige eenheidsstoornissen van karakter en woord, en stellen een nieuwe methode voor strategische stoornissen op zinsniveau voor. We experimenteren met verschillende hoeveelheden verstoringen om model vertrouwen en misclassificatie snelheid te onderzoeken, en contrastmodel prestaties met verschillende embeddings BERT en ELMo op twee benchmark datasets SQuAD en TriviaQA. We laten zien hoe je de prestaties van het model tijdens een tegenpartij kunt verbeteren door gebruik te maken van ensembles. Tot slot analyseren we factoren die invloed hebben op modelgedrag onder een tegenstrijdige aanval en ontwikkelen we een nieuw model om fouten te voorspellen tijdens aanvallen. Onze nieuwe bevindingen tonen aan dat (a) in tegenstelling tot BERT modellen die ELMo embeddings gebruiken gevoeliger zijn voor tegenstrijdige aanvallen, (b) in tegenstelling tot woord en parafrase, karakterverstoringen het meest invloed hebben op het model, maar het gemakkelijkst worden gecompenseerd door tegenstrijdige training, (c) woordverstoringen leiden tot meer zelfvertrouwen misclassificaties in vergelijking met zin- en karakterniveau verstoringen, (d) het type vraag en de antwoordlengte van het model (hoe langer het antwoord hoe waarschijnlijker het is dat het onjuist is) is de meest voorspellende modelfouten in tegenstrijdige setting, en (e) conclusies over modelgedrag zijn dataset-specifiek.', 'bg': 'Оценяваме здравината на невронния модел спрямо контразартни атаки, използвайки различни видове лингвистични смущения на единиците - характер и дума, и предлагаме нов метод за стратегически смущения на ниво изречение. Експериментираме с различни количества смущения, за да изследваме доверието на модела и степента на неправилно класифициране, както и контрастната производителност на модела с различни вграждания върху два сравнителни набора данни SQuAD и TriviaQA. Ние демонстрираме как да подобрим производителността на модела по време на съперническа атака с помощта на ансамбли. Накрая анализираме факторите, които влияят върху поведението на модела при съперническа атака и разработваме нов модел за прогнозиране на грешки по време на атаки. Нашите нови открития разкриват, че (а) за разлика от BERT, моделите, които използват вграждания на ЕЛМО, са по-податливи на атаки на конкуренцията, (б) за разлика от думи и парафрази, смущенията на знаците засягат модела най-много, но са най-лесно компенсирани чрез обучение на конкуренцията, (в) смущенията на думите водят до по-високо доверие грешни класификации в сравнение с смущенията на ниво изречение и символ, г) видът на въпроса и дължината на отговора на модела (колкото по-дълъг е отговорът, толкова по-вероятно е той да бъде неправилен) е най-предсказуема за грешки в модела в конферентната настройка, а д) заключенията за поведението на модела са специфични за набор от данни.', 'hr': 'Procjenjujemo jačinu neuralnog model a neprijateljskim napadima koristeći različite vrste perturbacije lingvističke jedinice - karakter i riječ, i predlažemo novu metodu za perturbacije na razini kazne. Eksperimentiramo s različitim količinama perturbacija da pregledamo brzinu poverenja modela i pogrešne klasifikacije, i kontrastične učinke modela s različitim integracijama BERT i ELMo na dva standardna dataseta SQuAD i TriviaQA. Pokazujemo kako poboljšati modelni učinkoviti tijekom neprijateljskog napada koristeći ensemble. Napokon, analiziramo faktore koji učinkuju na modelu ponašanja pod adversarnim napadom i razvijamo novi model kako bi predvidjeli greške tijekom napada. Naši novi nalazi otkrivaju da (a) za razliku od BERT-a, modeli koji koriste integraciju ELMo su osjetljiviji protiv neprijateljskih napada, b) za razliku od riječi i parafraze, perturbacije karaktera utječu na model najlakše, ali su najlakše kompenzirani protivnim treningama, c) perturbacije riječi dovele do visoke pogrešne klasifikacije povjerenja u usporedbu s perturbacijama kazne i razine karaktera, d) vrsta pitanja i dužin e odgovora modela (što je duže odgovor vjerojatnije da je nepravednije) najpredvidljivija je modelna greška u neprijateljskom postavljanju, a e) zaključki o modelnom ponašanju specifični su podaci.', 'ko': '우리는 서로 다른 유형의 언어 단원 교란(문자와 단어)을 사용하여 신경모델이 적에 대한 공격의 노봉성을 평가하고 새로운 전략적 문장급 교란 방법을 제시했다.우리는 모델의 신뢰도와 오분류율을 검사하기 위해 서로 다른 수량의 교란으로 실험을 진행하였으며, 두 개의 기준 데이터 집합인 SQuad와 TriviaQA에 서로 다른 BERT와 ELMo가 박힌 모델 성능을 비교하였다.우리는 집적을 사용하여 모델이 대항적인 공격에서의 성능을 향상시키는 방법을 보여 주었다.마지막으로 우리는 대항 공격에서 모델 행위에 영향을 주는 요소를 분석하고 새로운 모델을 개발하여 공격 과정에서의 오류를 예측했다.우리의 새로운 발견에 따르면 (a)는 BERT와 달리 ELMo를 사용하여 삽입된 모델은 대항적인 공격을 받기 쉽다. (b)는 단어와 해석과 달리 문자 간섭이 모델에 미치는 영향이 가장 크지만 대항적인 훈련을 통해 보상을 받기 쉽다. (c)는 문장과 문자급 간섭에 비해 단어 간섭이 더 높은 신뢰 오류 분류를 초래한다.(d) 문제 유형과 모델 답안의 길이(답안이 길수록 오류의 가능성이 크다)는 대항적인 환경에서 모델 오류에 대한 가장 예측적이고 모델 행위에 대한 결론은 데이터 집합에 특정된다.', 'id': 'Kami mengevaluasi kekuatan model saraf untuk serangan musuh menggunakan tipe yang berbeda perturbasi unit bahasa - karakter dan kata, dan mengusulkan metode baru untuk perturbasi strategis tingkat kalimat. We experiment with different amounts of perturbations to examine model confidence and misclassification rate, and contrast model performance with different embeddings BERT and ELMo on two benchmark datasets SQuAD and TriviaQA.  Kami menunjukkan bagaimana untuk meningkatkan prestasi model selama serangan musuh dengan menggunakan ensembles. Akhirnya, kami menganalisis faktor yang mempengaruhi perilaku model di bawah serangan musuh, dan mengembangkan model baru untuk memprediksi kesalahan selama serangan. Penemuan novel kami mengungkapkan bahwa (a) tidak seperti BERT, model yang menggunakan embedding ELMo lebih rentan untuk serangan musuh, (b) tidak seperti kata dan parafrasa, perturbasi karakter mempengaruhi model paling tetapi paling mudah disembunyikan oleh pelatihan musuh, (c) perturbasi kata mengakibatkan kesalahan kepercayaan tinggi dibandingkan dengan perturbasi kalimat dan karakter, (d) jenis pertanyaan dan panjang jawaban model (semakin panjang jawaban semakin kemungkinan itu salah) adalah yang paling prediksif dari kesalahan model dalam pengaturan musuh, dan (e) kesimpulan tentang perilaku model adalah spesifik dataset.', 'de': 'Wir evaluieren die Robustheit des neuronalen Modells gegenüber feindlichen Angriffen unter Verwendung verschiedener Arten von linguistischen Einheitenstörungen von Charakter und Wort und schlagen eine neue Methode für strategische Störungen auf Satzebene vor. Wir experimentieren mit unterschiedlichen Mengen von Störungen, um die Modellzuverlässigkeit und Fehlklassifikationsrate sowie die Kontrastmodellleistung mit unterschiedlichen Einbettungen BERT und ELMo auf zwei Benchmark-Datensätzen SQuAD und TriviaQA zu untersuchen. Wir demonstrieren, wie man die Modellleistung während eines gegnerischen Angriffs mithilfe von Ensembles verbessert. Schließlich analysieren wir Faktoren, die das Modellverhalten unter gegnerischen Angriffen beeinflussen, und entwickeln ein neues Modell, um Fehler während Angriffen vorherzusagen. Unsere neuen Erkenntnisse zeigen, dass (a) im Gegensatz zu BERT Modelle, die ELMo Einbettungen verwenden, anfälliger für gegnerische Angriffe sind, (b) im Gegensatz zu Wort und Paraphrase, Charakterstörungen das Modell am meisten beeinflussen, aber am einfachsten durch gegnerisches Training kompensiert werden, (c) Wortstörungen führen zu mehr Fehlklassifikationen im Vergleich zu Störungen auf Satz- und Zeichenebene, (d) die Art der Frage und die Antwortlänge des Modells (je länger die Antwort, desto wahrscheinlicher ist es, dass sie falsch ist) ist die Vorhersage von Modellfehlern in kontradierendem Setting, und (e) Schlussfolgerungen über das Modellverhalten sind datensatzspezifisch.', 'fa': 'ما مدل عصبی را با استفاده از نوع تکامل زبان مختلف ارزیابی می کنیم و یک روش جدید برای تغییرات سطح جمله استراتژیک پیشنهاد می کنیم. ما با اندازه\u200cهای مختلف تغییرات آزمایش می\u200cکنیم تا نرخ اعتماد مدل و گروه\u200cهای مختلف را تحقیق کنیم، و اجرای مدل مختلف را با استفاده\u200cهای متفاوت BERT و ELMo در دو مجموعه داده\u200cهای ابتدایی SQuAD و TriviaQA تحقیق کنیم. ما نشان می دهیم که چگونه عملکرد مدل را در طول حمله دشمنی با استفاده از انجملها بهتر کنیم. بالاخره، ما فاکتورها را تحلیل می کنیم که رفتار مدل تحت حمله دشمنی تأثیر می دهند، و یک مدل جدید برای پیش بینی از اشتباهی در طول حمله توسعه می دهیم. نتیجه\u200cهای روانی ما نشان می\u200cدهند که (a) غیر از BERT، مدل\u200cهای استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از ELMo به حمله\u200cهای دشمنی بیشتر هستند, (b) غیر از کلمه و پارافراز، تبدیل کردن شخصیت\u200cها به مدل بیشتری تأثیر می\u200cدهند، ولی آسانترین تأثیر از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده (d) نوع سؤال و مدل پاسخ (زیادی طولانی که احتمال اشتباه\u200cتر است) بهترین پیش\u200cبینی از اشتباه\u200cهای مدل در تنظیم مخالف است، و (e) نتیجه\u200cهای درباره رفتار مدل خاص\u200cترین مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها است.', 'tr': 'Biz neural nusgasyny d체첵b체rli 챌yky힊lar 체챌in d체첵b체rli 챌yky힊lara - karakter we s철z we stratejik s철zler derejesi 체챌in t채ze bir 첵ol maslahat ber첵채ris. Biz farkl캇 kararlar arasynda 철rnek ynamly we 첵al흫y힊 klasifikasy derejesi barlamak 체챌in 철rnekler 챌yk첵arys we farkl캇 birle힊meler BERT we ELMo 체챌in 철rnekler 챌yk첵arys. SQuAD we TriviaQA iki benchmark datasetinde. Biz ensembler ulanyp nusgala etm채ni n채dip t채sirli etm채ni d체zele힊tirip g철rke첵채ris. So흫unda, 챌yky힊 wagtynda nusgala salyklaryny흫 altynda n채hili hereketleri t채sirle첵채n faktorlary 챌철z체rip, we 첵al흫y힊lyklary흫 첵al흫y힊lygyny 철흫den ge챌irmek 체챌in t채ze bir nusga 챌yk첵arys. Bizi흫 romanlarymyzy흫 tapylyklarymyz BERT 첵aly g철rkezil첵채r, ELMo integralaryny ulanan modelleri흫 s철zleri we parafrazleri흫 첵aly, karakterleri흫 terbiyeleri model i흫 k철p sanynda t채sir ed첵채r 첵철ne a 흫satly t채sir ed첵채r, (c) s철zleri흫 terbiyeleri s철zleri흫 we karakterleri흫 derejesi terbiyelerine g철r채 첵okary-첵okary ynamly terbiyelere 첵ok bir 힊ekilde 체첵tged첵채r, (d) soragy흫 we nusga uzlygyny (jogaby흫 첵al흫y힊 bolmagy ahmal bolmagy ahmal bolmagy ahmal) nusga d 체z체mlerinde i흫 uly nusga d체z체mlendir, we (e) nusga d체z체mleri barada hat-a d체z체mlendir.', 'sw': 'Tunatathmini uvunjifu wa mifano ya kidini dhidi ya mashambulizi yanayopinga kwa kutumia aina mbalimbali za kituo cha lugha - tabia na neno, na pendekeza njia mpya ya uvunjifu wa kiwango cha kiuchunguzi. Tunajaribu kwa kiasi tofauti cha majaribio ili kuchunguza kiwango cha imani na ufafanuzi wa mifano, na utendaji wa mifano tofauti na vifaa vya BERT na ELMo katika takwimu mbili za bendera SQuAD na TriviaQA. Tunaonyesha namna ya kuboresha utendaji wa mifano wakati wa shambulio la upinzani kwa kutumia mabomu. Mwisho, tunachambua sababu zinazoathiri tabia za model wakati wa shambulio la upinzani, na kutengeneza mtindo mpya wa kutabiri makosa wakati wa mashambulizi. Matokeo yetu ya riwaya yanaonyesha kuwa (a) tofauti na BERT, mifano inayotumia vifaa vya ELMo vina mashambulizi yanayopingana zaidi, (b) tofauti na maneno na upinzani, uvunjaji wa tabia unaathiri muundo huo zaidi lakini ni rahisi zaidi kupatikana na mafunzo ya upinzani, (c) uvunjaji wa maneno yanasababisha tofauti za imani zaidi ukilinganishwa na uvunjifu wa kiwango cha hukumu- na kiwango cha tabia, (d) aina ya swali na jibu la model (kwa muda mrefu jibu ambalo inawezekana kuwa si sahihi) ni utabiri zaidi wa makosa ya model katika mazingira ya upinzani, na (e) hitimisho kuhusu tabia za modeli ni takwimu maalum.', 'sq': 'Ne vlerësojmë fuqinë e modelit nervor ndaj sulmeve kundërshtare duke përdorur lloje të ndryshme perturbacionesh të njësisë gjuhësore - karakter dhe fjalë, dhe propozojmë një metodë të re për perturbacione strategjike në nivelin e dënimit. Eksperimentojmë me sasi të ndryshme perturbacionesh për të shqyrtuar besimin e modelit dhe normën e klasifikimit të gabuar dhe performancën e modelit të kontrastit me përfshirje të ndryshme BERT dhe ELMo në dy baza të dhënash SQuAD dhe TriviaQA. Ne demonstrojmë si të përmirësojmë paraqitjen e modelit gjatë një sulmi kundërshtar duke përdorur ansamble. Më në fund, ne analizojmë faktorë që efektojnë sjelljen e modelit nën sulmin kundërshtar, dhe zhvillojmë një model të ri për të parashikuar gabimet gjatë sulmeve. Our novel findings reveal that (a) unlike BERT, models that use ELMo embeddings are more susceptible to adversarial attacks, (b) unlike word and paraphrase, character perturbations affect the model the most but are most easily compensated for by adversarial training, (c) word perturbations lead to more high-confidence misclassifications compared to sentence- and character-level perturbations,  (d) the type of question and model answer length (the longer the answer the more likely it is to be incorrect) is the most predictive of model errors in adversarial setting, and (e) conclusions about model behavior are dataset-specific.', 'hy': 'Մենք գնահատում ենք նյարդային մոդելի ուժեղությունը հակառակյալ հարձակումների համար օգտագործելով տարբեր տեսակի լեզվաբանական միավորի խառնաշփումներ՝ բնույթ և բառ, և առաջարկում ենք նոր մեթոդ նախադասությունների մակարդակի խառնաշփումն Մենք փորձում ենք տարբեր քանակությամբ խռովություններ ուսումնասիրելու մոդելների վստահությունը և սխալ դասակարգման արագությունը, և հակադրական մոդելների արտադրողությունը տարբեր ներդրումներով BER և ELMo երկու համեմատային տվյալների համակարգերի SQUADand and TreviaQ Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, թե ինչպես բարելավել մոդելը հակառակ հարձակումների ընթացքում, օգտագործելով էնսեմբլեր: Finally, we analyze factors that effect model behavior under adversarial attack, and develop a new model to predict errors during attacks.  Մեր նոր հայտնաբերությունները բացահայտում են, որ a) ի տարբերություն BER-ին, մոդելները, որոնք օգտագործում են ELMo-ի ներդրումները ավելի խոցելի են հակառակ հարձակումներին, b) ի տարբերություն բառերին և պարաֆրեզներին, բնորոշների խառնաշփումները ազդում են մոդելի վրա ամենաշատ, բայց ամենահեշտ փոխարինվում են հակառակ վարժեցման միջոցով, c) բառերի խառնաշփումները հանգե d) հարցի տեսակը և մոդելի պատասխանի երկարությունը (ինչքան ավելի երկար է պատասխանը, այնքան ավելի հավանական է, որ այն սխալ է) ամենականխատեսելի է մոդելի սխալները հակառակյալ միջավայրում, և e) մոդելի վարքագիծի եզրակացությունները տվյալների համակարգի մասնավոր են:', 'am': 'የኔሩኤል ሞዴል ሽፋኖችን በተቃዋሚው የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች በተለያዩ ልዩ ዓይነት የቋንቋ ብሔራዊ ክፍተት እና ቃላትን እናስተዋልታለን፣ እናም ለጣራሲካዊ ክፍል-ደረጃ ተቃውሞ መግለጫ እና አዲስ ልማድ እናስጀምራለን፡፡ በሁለት benchmark ዳታዎች SQuAD እና TriviaQA ላይ እና በተለየ ብሬት እና ELMo በተለየ የሞዴል ክፍተቶችን ለመመርመርመር በተለየ ብሔራዊ ጥያቄዎችን እና በተለየ ጥያቄዎችን እና መፈትነናል፡፡ በተቃዋሚ ምሳሌ በመጠቀም የሞዴል ሥራ እንዴት እንዲያሳድግ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ በመጨረሻውም፣ ሞዴል ሁኔታ በተቃዋሚ ጦር ላይ የሚሠራውን እናሳውቃለን፣ በተመሳሳይም ጊዜ ስህተቶችን ለማሳየት አዲስ ሞዴል እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የአሁኑን ፍለጋዎች (a) ብሬት፣ የኤሌሞን ግንኙነት የሚጠቀም ሞዴላዎች በተቃዋሚ ጦር ላይ የሚጠራጠሩ ናቸው፣ (b) በተለየ ቃላት እና መግለጫ፣ በተለየ ቃላት እና የፊደል ግንኙነት በሞዴል አብዛኛውን ነገር ግን በተቃዋሚ ትምህርት ማህበረሰብ በጣም ቀላል ነው፣ (c) ቃላት ክፍለ ክፍል እና በክፍለ ክፍል ክፍተት ክፍተቶችን በሚያሳያል፣ (d) የጥያቄ እና የሞዴል መልስ ርዝመት (ምናልባት የስህተት መሆኑን መቆጣጠር ይችላል) የሞዴል ስህተት በተቃዋሚ አካሄድ ውስጥ የሚታወቀው የሞዴል ስህተት ነው (e) በሞዴል ሁኔታ ላይ የሚጫወቱ ዳታተርክሲ ናቸው።', 'az': 'Biz nöral modeli güclüyü müxtəlif dil birliklərinin perturbasyonu ilə müxtəlif tərzlərinə düşmənçilik saldıqlarına değerləşdiririk - karakter və söz, və stratejik sözlərin səviyyəsi perturbasyonu üçün yeni bir metod təklif edirik. Biz modeli güvenilir və yanlış klasifikasyon dərəsini incitmək üçün fərqli perturbasyon sayıları ilə imtahana çəkirik, BERT və ELMo iki benchmark veri seti SQuAD və TriviaQA ilə müxtəlif modeli performansı ilə müxtəlif inşallarla təşkil edirik. Biz, ensembli vasitəsilə düşmənçilik saldırısında modellərin performansını necə yaxşılaşdıracağını göstəririk. Sonunda, düşmənçilik salınması altında modellərin davranışlarını analiz edirik və fətaların öndənməsi üçün yeni modelləri təşkil edirik. Bizim yeni tapındıqlarımız belə göstərir ki, a) BERT kimi, ELMo inşallarını istifadə edən modellər düşmənçi saldıqlarına daha çox təsirli, b) sözlər və parafrazlər kimi, karakter inşalları modellərin ən çox təsirlərinə müvafiq edir, amma ən asanlıqla düşmənçi təhsil ilə müvafiq edilirlər, (c) sözlər inşalları sözləri ilə daha yüksək təvəkkül dəyişikliklərinə b ənz d) sual və modellərin uzunluğu (daha uzun cavabı yanlış olaraq daha çox olaraq) d üşmənçilik tərzində modellərin xətalarının ən gözəl tədbir və e) modellərin davranışları barəsindəki sonuçları verilən quruluşdur.', 'bn': 'We evaluate neural model robustness to adversarial attacks using different types of linguistic unit perturbations - character and word, and propose a new method for strategic sentence-level perturbations.  আমরা বিভিন্ন ধরনের বিভিন্ন পরীক্ষায় পরীক্ষা করছি মডেলের আত্মবিশ্বাস এবং ভুল বিভক্তি হার পরীক্ষা করার জন্য, এবং বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ আমরা বিরোধী আক্রমণের সময় মডেলের প্রভাব উন্নত করে দেখাচ্ছি কিভাবে বিরোধী আক্রমণের মাধ্যমে। শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা বিশ্লেষণ করি যে মডেলের আচরণ বিরোধী আক্রমণের সময় প্রভাব ফেলে দেয় এবং আক্রমণের সময় ভুল ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করার জন্য একটি নতুন আমাদের উপস্থাপনের ফলাফল প্রকাশ করেছে (a) বেরেটির মতো নয়, যারা ইএলমো ব্যবহার করেছে তাদের মডেল বিরোধী আক্রমণের জন্য আরো সন্দেহ প্রদান করে, (b) শব্দ এবং প্যারাফারেশন, চরিত্রের বিষয়টি মডেলের প্রভাব ফেলেছে বেশীরভাগ কিন্তু বিরোধী  (d) প্রশ্ন এবং মডেলের উত্তরের ধরনের দীর্ঘ (যতদিন তা ভুল হতে পারে তার উত্তর) হচ্ছে বিরোধী বৈশিষ্ট্যের মধ্যে মডেলের সবচেয়ে ভবিষ্যৎবাণী এবং (e) মডেল আচরণ সম্পর্', 'bs': 'Procjenjujemo neuralnu modelu robustnost protiv adversarnih napada koristeći različite vrste perturbacije jezičkih jedinica - karaktera i riječi, i predlažemo novi metod za perturbacije na nivou kazne. Eksperimentiramo sa različitim količinama perturbacija kako bi pregledali model poverenja i pogrešnu klasifikaciju, i kontrastirali model izvedbe s različitim integracijama BERT i ELMo na dva standardna dataseta SQuAD i TriviaQA. Pokazujemo kako da poboljšamo modelnu funkciju tijekom neprijateljskog napada koristeći ensemble. Napokon, analiziramo faktore koji utiču na model pod adversarnim napadom i razvijamo novi model da predvidimo greške tokom napada. Naši novi nalazi otkrivaju da (a) za razliku od BERT, modeli koji koriste uključenje ELMo su osjetljiviji protiv neprijateljskih napada, b) za razliku od riječi i parafraze, perturbacije karaktera utječu na model najlakše, ali su najlakše kompenzirani protivnim treningama, c) perturbacije riječi dovele do visoke pogrešne klasifikacije povjerenja u usporedbu s perturbacijama kazne i nivoa karaktera, d) vrsta pitanja i dužin e odgovora modela (što duže odgovor vjerojatno je nepravedniji) je najpredvidljivija modela greška u neprijateljskom postavljanju, a e) zaključki o modelu ponašanju su specifični podaci.', 'ca': "We evaluate neural model robustness to adversarial attacks using different types of linguistic unit perturbations - character and word, and propose a new method for strategic sentence-level perturbations.  We experiment with different amounts of perturbations to examine model confidence and misclassification rate, and contrast model performance with different embeddings BERT and ELMo on two benchmark datasets SQuAD and TriviaQA.  We demonstrate how to improve model performance during an adversarial attack by using ensembles.  Finally, we analyze factors that effect model behavior under adversarial attack, and develop a new model to predict errors during attacks.  Els nostres noves descobriments revelen que a) a diferència de BERT, els models que utilitzen incorporacions ELMo són més susceptibles a atacs adversaris, b) a diferència de parafrases i parafrases, les perturbacions de caràcter afecten el model més, però són més fàcilment compensades per l'entrenament adversari, c) les perturbacions de parafrases porten a una mala classificació d'alta confiança comparada amb les perturbacions de frases i caràcter, d) el tipus d e pregunta i la llargada de la resposta del model (més llarga és la resposta més probable que sigui incorrecta) és el model d'errors més preditius en l'entorn adversari, i e) les conclusions sobre el comportament del model són específices al conjunt de dades.", 'cs': 'Vyhodnocujeme robustnost neuronového modelu vůči nepřátelským útokům pomocí různých typů lingvistických jednotek poruchy znaku a slova a navrhujeme novou metodu pro strategické poruchy na úrovni věty. Experimentujeme s různými množstvími poruch, abychom zkoumali důvěru modelu a rychlost chybné klasifikace a výkon kontrastního modelu s různými vloženími BERT a ELMo na dvou referenčních datových sadách SQuAD a TriviaQA. Ukážeme, jak zlepšit výkon modelu během nepřátelského útoku pomocí souborů. V závěru analyzujeme faktory, které ovlivňují chování modelu při nepřátelském útoku, a vyvineme nový model pro predikci chyb během útoků. Naše nové zjištění ukazují, že (a) na rozdíl od BERT jsou modely, které používají ELMo vložení, náchylnější k nepřátelským útokům, (b) na rozdíl od slova a parafráze, poruchy znaků ovlivňují model nejvíce, ale jsou nejsnadněji kompenzovány protivním tréninkem, (c) poruchy slov vedou k větším chybným klasifikacím ve srovnání s poruchami věty a znaků, (d) typ otázky a délka odpovědi modelu (čím delší je odpověď, tím pravděpodobnější, že bude nesprávná) je nejvíce prediktivní z modelových chyb v protivním nastavení a (e) závěry o chování modelu jsou specifické pro datovou sadu.', 'et': 'Hindame närvimudeli tugevust vastandlikele rünnakutele, kasutades erinevat tüüpi keeleüksuste häireid - iseloomu ja sõna, ning pakume välja uue meetodi lausetaseme häireteks. Eksperimenteerime erinevate häirete kogustega, et uurida mudeli usaldusväärsust ja valeklassifikatsiooni määra ning kontrastmudeli jõudlust erinevate manustamistega BERT ja ELMo kahele võrdlusandmekogumile SQuAD ja TriviaQA. Näitame, kuidas parandada mudeli jõudlust vastasrünnaku ajal ansamblite abil. Lõpuks analüüsime tegureid, mis mõjutavad mudeli käitumist vastasrünnaku korral, ja töötame välja uue mudeli, et ennustada vigu rünnakute ajal. Meie uudsed tulemused näitavad, et a) erinevalt BERT-ist on ELMo manustamist kasutavad mudelid vastuvõtlikumad vastasrünnakutele, b) erinevalt sõnadest ja parafraasidest mõjutavad märgihäired mudelit kõige rohkem, kuid neid kompenseerib kõige kergemini vastasrõpetamine, c) sõnade häired põhjustavad suuremat usaldusväärset klassifikatsiooni võrreldes lause- ja märgitasandi häiretega, d) küsimuse tüüp ja mudeli vastuse pikkus (mida pikem vastus, seda tõenäolisemalt on see vale) ennustavad kõige rohkem mudeli vigu vastava seadistuse puhul ning e) järeldused mudeli käitumise kohta on andmekogumi spetsiifilised.', 'fi': 'Arvioimme neuromallin kestävyyttä vastustajiin kohdistuville hyökkäyksille käyttäen erityyppisiä kielellisten yksiköiden häiriöitä - luonnetta ja sanaa, ja ehdotamme uutta menetelmää strategisiin lausetason häiriöihin. Kokeilemme eri häiriöiden määriä mallin luotettavuuden ja virheluokituksen selvittämiseksi sekä kontrastimallin suorituskykyä erilaisilla upotuksilla BERT ja ELMo kahdella vertailuaineistolla SQuAD ja TriviaQA. Näytämme, miten mallien suorituskykyä voidaan parantaa vastustajahyökkäyksen aikana kokoonpanojen avulla. Lopuksi analysoimme tekijöitä, jotka vaikuttavat mallikäyttäytymiseen vastustajahyökkäyksen aikana, ja kehitämme uuden mallin ennustamaan virheitä hyökkäyksen aikana. Uudet löydöksemme osoittavat, että (a) toisin kuin BERT, ELMo-upotuksia käyttävät mallit ovat alttiimpia vastustajille, (b) toisin kuin sana ja parafraasi, merkkihäiriöt vaikuttavat malliin eniten, mutta ne kompensoidaan helpoimmin vastustajien harjoittelulla, (c) sanahäiriöt johtavat suurempaan luottamukseen perustuviin väärinkäsityksiin verrattuna lause- ja merkkitason häiriöihin, (d) kysymyksen tyyppi ja mallivastauksen pituus (mitä pidempi vastaus on, sitä todennäköisemmin se on virheellinen) ennustavat parhaiten mallivirheitä vastakkainasettelussa, ja (e) johtopäätökset mallin käyttäytymisestä ovat aineistokohtaisia.', 'af': "Ons evalueer neurale model kragtigheid na teenstandaarde atake met verskillende tipes lingwisiese eenhede perturbasies - karakter en woord, en voorstel 'n nuwe metode vir strategiese setningvlak perturbasies. Ons eksperimenteer met verskillende hoeveelheid perturbasies om model vertroue en misklasifikasie tempo te ondersoek, en kontras model prestasie met verskillende inbêdings BERT en ELMo op twee benchmark datastel SQuAD en TriviaQA. Ons wys hoe om model effektuur te verbeter gedurende 'n teëstandige atak deur ensemble te gebruik. Eindelik, ons analiseer faktore wat effekt model gedrag onder teëstandige aanval, en ontwikkel 'n nuwe model om foute voorskou tydens atake te voorskou. Ons nuwe gevinde openbaar dat (a) ongelukkig van BERT, modele wat ELMo inbettings gebruik is meer aanvaardig aan teenstandaarlike atake, (b) ongelukkig van woord en parafrase, karakterperturbasies het die model die mees, maar is makliker vergelyk vir deur teenstandaarlike onderwerking, (c) woord perturbasies lei na meer hoë-vertroue misklasifikasies vergelyk met sentence- en karaktervlak perturbasies, (d) die tipe vraag en model antwoord lengte (die langer die antwoord die meer waarskynlik d it is verkeerde) is die mees voorskou van model foute in teëindige opstelling, en (e) konklusies oor model gedrag is datastel-spesifieke.", 'jv': 'We assessor Neral model botus to anti-invarial Attacks use a separated types of language unit pertruations - character and word, and proposal a new method for structural string-evel pertruations. This is the first language that can be used to compromise the language with the same language. Awak dhéwé éntuk karo akeh sampeyan pertrukasi kanggo bisa nggunian model kuwi ngregani soko ngregani soko ngregani soko ngregani soko nggawe barang kelas, lan kontra model nggawe barang sampeyan karo embedding BERT lan ETMo sampeyan iki bench dataseteng sqUED lan TribiaqA. Awakdhéwé éntuk ngerasakno ngono nggawe modèl kanggo ngerasakno wis ana karo perbudhakan winih Lha wih-wih, kéné ngerasakno karo pernik kuwi sawar mungkin anyar tentang karo pernik aksi, lan uga model sing gawe nggawe barang nggo ngerasakno eror. We rome find find show that (a) Unllike BERT, modes that use elMo embedding are additional suscepsible to anti-conflicts, ((b) Unllike word and paratext, character perturations affect the model the first and are the mester readly kompensed for by anti-conflicting, ((c) word perturations go to the additional height-conflicts misCLASS ratio to French- and character-rate perturations, (d) kalit perusahaan lan mbuluk model sakjane (bah dhéwé luwih apik adalah cara sing dirampakan) iku dianteksi sing gak adhil kudu kamuran', 'sk': 'Z uporabo različnih vrst motenj jezikovnih enot – znakov in besed – ocenjujemo robustnost nevronskega modela na kontradiktorske napade in predlagamo novo metodo za strateške motnje stavkov. Eksperimentiramo z različnimi količinami motenj, da preučimo zaupanje modelov in stopnjo napačnega razvrščanja ter kontrastno zmogljivost modela z različnimi vdelavami BERT in ELMo na dveh referenčnih naborih podatkov SQuAD in TriviaQA. Z uporabo ansamblov prikazujemo, kako izboljšati zmogljivost modela med kontradikcijskim napadom. Nazadnje analiziramo dejavnike, ki vplivajo na vedenje modela pod kontrastnim napadom, in razvijamo nov model za napovedovanje napak med napadi. Naše nove ugotovitve kažejo, da so (a) za razliko od BERT modelov, ki uporabljajo ELMo vdelave, bolj dovzetni za kontradiktorske napade, (b) za razliko od besed in parafraze motnje znakov najbolj vplivajo na model, vendar jih najlažje nadomesti s kontradiktorskim treningom, (c) motnje besed vodijo do večje napačne razvrstitve v primerjavi s motnjami na ravni stavka in znakov, (d) vrsta vprašanja in dolžina odgovora modela (daljši kot je odgovor, večja je verjetnost, da bo napačen) je najbolj napovedovalna napaka modela v kontradikcijski nastavitvi in (e) sklepi o vedenju modela so specifični za nabor podatkov.', 'ha': "Tuna ƙaddara manyan shawarar neural da ke amfani da nau'i-nau'i-nau'i-nau'i-nau'i-nau'in linguistic- karatun da kalma, kuma tuna buƙata wata hanyoyi wa turturbatori-daraja. Tuna jarrabi da wasu turbuɗe dabam-dabam domin ka jarraba shawarar ayuka masu aminci da kuma misclassified, kuma masu motsi da kwamfyutan motsi na daban-dabam da BERT da ELMo kan danne biyu na bangon-bangon, SQuAD da TrevieQA. Tuna nũna jini za Mu improve performance misalin a lokacin da ke yi amfani da misemboli. Haƙĩƙa, Munã sanar da masu matsayi waɗanda ke yin amfani da aikin motsi a ƙara shawarar motsi, kuma mu tsãge wani motel na daban dõmin ka yi gafakar errors a lokacin da ake yi attacka. FantayinMu na yanzu suka bayyana (a) kama BERT, misãlai waɗanda ke amfani da ELMo da embeddinga su fi shakka ga attacki masu motsi, (b) sambacin maganar da b a ƙata, baƙaƙƙe masu amfani da muhimmi, kuma ana yi amfani da shi da mafiya sauƙi ga amfani da mai motsi, (c) turturbatori masu ƙaranci ga fassarar-aminci da sammenlikin sarrafa-da-daraja, @ info", 'he': 'אנו מעריכים את חוזקת מודל עצבי לתקפים יריביים באמצעות סוגים שונים של הפרעות יחידות לשוניות - אופי ומילה, ומציעים שיטה חדשה לפרעות סטרטגיות רמת משפטים. אנו מנסים עם כמויות שונות של הפרעות כדי לבדוק ביטחון מודל וקצב טעות מסווג, וביצוע מודל שונה עם תוכניות שונות BERT ואלמו על שני קבוצות נתונים רמז SQuAD וטריביה QA. אנחנו מראים איך לשפר את ההופעה של המודל במהלך התקפה יריבית באמצעות אנסמבלים. סוף סוף, אנו מנתחים גורמים שמשפיעים על התנהגות מודל תחת התקפה יריבית, ופתחים מודל חדש כדי לחזות שגיאות במהלך התקפות. הממצאים החדשים שלנו חושפים כי (a) בניגוד לברט, דוגמנים שמשתמשים בתקפות ELMo הם יותר רגישים לתקפות יריבות, (b) בניגוד למילה ופרphrase, הפרעות אופיינים משפיעות על הדוגמנים הכי בקלות אבל הם מופרדים ביותר על ידי אימון יריבי, (c) הפרעות המילים מובילות לשטעות ביטחון גבוה יותר בהשוואה לפרעות משפטים וברמת אופיינים, (d) סוג השאלה והאורך של תשובה מודל (ככל שהתשובה תהיה יותר סבירה שזה לא נכון) הוא הטיפוס הכי צפוי של שגיאות מודל במצב יריבי, ו (e) המסקנות על התנהגות מודל הם ספציפיים לקבוצת נתונים.', 'bo': 'We evaluate neural model robustness to adversarial attacks using different types of linguistic unit perturbations - character and word, and propose a new method for strategic sentence-level perturbations. A lot of linguistic unit perturbations are used in different ways. We experiment with different amounts of perturbations to examine model confidence and misclassification rate, and contrast model performance with different embeddings BERT and ELMo on two benchmark datasets SQuAD and TriviaQA. ང་ཚོས་མཚོན་རྟགས་སྤྱོད་པའི་ལྡོག་རིམ་གྱི་གནོད་འཐབ་པའི་སྐབས་རྐྱེན་ཚད་རྒྱས་རྗོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཡར མཐའ་མར་ང་ཚོས་དབུགས་གནོད་འགྲུལ་བྱེད་པའི་རྒྱུ་ནོར་བཅས་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Our novel findings reveal that (a) unlike BERT, models that use ELMo embeddings are more susceptible to adversarial attacks, (b) unlike word and paraphrase, character perturbations affect the model the most but are most easily compensated for by adversarial training, (c) word perturbations lead to more high-confidence misclassifications compared to sentence- and character-level perturbations, (d) the type of question and model answer length (the longer the answer the more likely it is to be incorrect) is the most predictive of model errors in adversarial setting, and (e) conclusions about model behavior are dataset-specific.'}
{'en': 'Hidden Biases in Unreliable News Detection Datasets', 'pt': 'Tendências ocultas em conjuntos de dados de detecção de notícias não confiáveis', 'ar': 'التحيزات الخفية في مجموعات بيانات اكتشاف الأخبار غير الموثوق بها', 'fr': "Biais cachés dans des ensembles de données de détection d'actualités peu fiables", 'es': 'Prejuicios ocultos en conjuntos de datos de detección de noticias poco fiables', 'ja': '信頼性の低いニュース検出データセットの隠れたバイアス', 'zh': '不可凭新闻检数聚隐偏', 'ru': 'Скрытые погрешности в ненадежных наборах данных обнаружения новостей', 'hi': 'अविश्वसनीय समाचार डिटेक्शन डेटासेट में छिपे हुए पूर्वाग्रह', 'ga': 'Laofachtaí i bhfolach i dtacair sonraí maidir le braite nuachta neamhiontaofa', 'el': 'Κρυμμένες προκαταλήψεις σε μη αξιόπιστα σύνολα δεδομένων ανίχνευσης ειδήσεων', 'hu': 'Rejtett hibák a nem megbízható hírek felismerési adatkészletekben', 'ka': 'დამართებული მონაცემების მონაცემების შესახებ', 'it': 'Biasi nascosti nei dataset di rilevamento di notizie inaffidabili', 'mk': 'Скриени промени во недоверливи датотеки за детекција на вести', 'lt': 'Slėpti trūkumai nepatikimuose naujienų aptikimo duomenų rinkiniuose', 'kk': 'Сенім емес жаңалық анықтау деректер деректерінде жасырылған бөлшектері', 'ms': 'Bias Tersembunyi dalam Set Data Pengesan Berita Tidak Dapat Dipercayai', 'ml': 'വിശ്വസിക്കാത്ത വാര്\u200dത്ത ഡേറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d മറഞ്ഞിരിക്കുന്ന ബൈസുകള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Disturbi Miħbija f’Settijiet ta’ Dejta ta’ Żvelar ta’ Aħbarijiet mhux affidabbli', 'pl': 'Ukryte uprzedzenia w niewiarygodnych zbiorach danych wykrywania wiadomości', 'sr': 'Skriveni podaci u nepouzdanim novinama', 'ro': 'Biase ascunse în seturi de date de detectare a știrilor nesigure', 'no': 'Gøymde oppløysingar i ukjende databaser for oppdaging av nyhetar', 'sv': 'Dolda missförhållanden i osäkra dataset för upptäckt av nyheter', 'si': 'විශ්වාස නොවිශ්වාසයි වාර්තාව හොයාගන්න දත්ත පරීක්ෂණය', 'so': 'Biisyada qarsoon ee lagu sameeyo macluumaadka la xiriira macluumaadka aan rumaysanayn', 'mn': 'Хүмүүст итгэлгүй мэдээллийн мэдээллийн мэдээллийн мэдээллүүд', 'ta': 'நம்பிக்கை இல்லாத செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பு தகவல் அமைப்பில் மறைக்கப்பட்ட வாய்ப்புகள்', 'ur': 'غیرقابل اخبار شناسایی ڈاٹیس میں چھپائے ہوئے بیز', 'uz': 'Hidden Biases in Unreliable News Detection Datasets', 'vi': 'Ẩn dấu trong bộ nhớ truy cập tin tức bất khả thi', 'da': 'Skjulte fejl i upålidelige nyheder detektion datasæt', 'bg': 'Скрити предразсъдъци в неподходящи набори от данни за откриване на новини', 'nl': 'Verborgen vooroordelen in onbetrouwbare nieuwsdetectiedatasets', 'de': 'Versteckte Vorurteile in unzuverlässigen Datensätzen zur Nachrichtenerkennung', 'id': 'Bias tersembunyi dalam Dataset Deteksi Berita Tidak Dapat Dipercayai', 'hr': 'Skriveni podaci o nepouzdanim novinama', 'tr': 'Gürekli Jaňlar Aňlamak Maglumatynda Gizli Bölekler', 'ko': '신뢰할 수 없는 뉴스 검측 데이터 집중에 숨겨진 편견', 'af': 'Versteekte Bies in Onvertroubare Nuus Opdekking DatabaseName', 'sw': 'Matukio yaliyofichikana katika seti za Kugundua Habari zisizo na imani', 'fa': 'داستان\u200cهای مخفی در اطلاعات شناسایی خبرهای غیرقابل اعتماد', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Անվստահելի նորությունների հայտնաբերման տվյալների բացահայտումները', 'az': '쒰湡滄녬浡稠䡡煱⁋旅齦整淉餠噥物泉饲椊', 'bn': 'অবিশ্বাস্য সংবাদ তথ্য সনাক্তির মধ্যে লুকিয়ে রাখা বাইজ', 'bs': 'Skriveni podaci u neopouzdanim novinama', 'et': 'Varjatud eelarvamused ebausaldusväärsetes uudiste tuvastamise andmekogumites', 'ca': 'Malformacions ocultes en conjunts de dades de detecció de notícies poc fiables', 'sq': 'Hidden Biases in Unreliable News Detection Datasets', 'cs': 'Skryté předsudky v nespolehlivých datových sadách detekce zpráv', 'fi': 'Piilotetut ennakkoluulot epäluotettavissa uutisten tunnistustietoissa', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'sk': 'Skrite pristranskosti v nezanesljivih naborih podatkov o zaznavanju novic', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'བློ་གཏད་མེད་པའི་བརྡ་ཞིག་བཙལ་བཤེར་གྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ནང་ཡིབ་པའི་འགྱུར་བ', 'he': 'הפרעות מוסתרות במערכות נתונים בלתי אמינים לגלות חדשות'}
{'en': 'Automatic unreliable news detection is a research problem with great potential impact. Recently, several papers have shown promising results on large-scale news datasets with models that only use the article itself without resorting to any fact-checking mechanism or retrieving any supporting evidence. In this work, we take a closer look at these datasets. While they all provide valuable resources for future research, we observe a number of problems that may lead to results that do not generalize in more realistic settings. Specifically, we show that selection bias during data collection leads to undesired artifacts in the datasets. In addition, while most systems train and predict at the level of individual articles, overlapping article sources in the training and evaluation data can provide a strong confounding factor that models can exploit. In the presence of this confounding factor, the models can achieve good performance by directly memorizing the site-label mapping instead of modeling the real task of unreliable news detection. We observed a significant drop (10 %) in accuracy for all models tested in a clean split with no train / test source overlap. Using the observations and experimental results, we provide practical suggestions on how to create more reliable datasets for the unreliable news detection task. We suggest future dataset creation include a simple model as a difficulty / bias probe and future model development use a clean non-overlapping site and date split.', 'pt': 'A detecção automática de notícias não confiáveis é um problema de pesquisa com grande impacto potencial. Recentemente, vários artigos mostraram resultados promissores em conjuntos de dados de notícias em grande escala com modelos que usam apenas o próprio artigo sem recorrer a nenhum mecanismo de verificação de fatos ou recuperar qualquer evidência de apoio. Neste trabalho, examinamos mais de perto esses conjuntos de dados. Embora todos eles forneçam recursos valiosos para pesquisas futuras, observamos vários problemas que podem levar a resultados que não se generalizam em cenários mais realistas. Especificamente, mostramos que o viés de seleção durante a coleta de dados leva a artefatos indesejados nos conjuntos de dados. Além disso, embora a maioria dos sistemas treine e preveja no nível de artigos individuais, a sobreposição de fontes de artigos nos dados de treinamento e avaliação pode fornecer um forte fator de confusão que os modelos podem explorar. Na presença desse fator de confusão, os modelos podem obter um bom desempenho memorizando diretamente o mapeamento do rótulo do site em vez de modelar a tarefa real de detecção de notícias não confiáveis. Observamos uma queda significativa (10%) na precisão para todos os modelos testados em uma divisão limpa sem sobreposição de fonte de trem/teste. Usando as observações e resultados experimentais, fornecemos sugestões práticas sobre como criar conjuntos de dados mais confiáveis para a tarefa de detecção de notícias não confiáveis. Sugerimos que a criação de conjuntos de dados futuros inclua um modelo simples como uma sonda de dificuldade/viés e o desenvolvimento de modelos futuros use um site limpo sem sobreposição e divisão de datas.', 'fr': "La détection automatique de nouvelles peu fiables est un problème de recherche ayant un impact potentiel important. Récemment, plusieurs articles ont montré des résultats prometteurs sur des ensembles de données d'actualités à grande échelle avec des modèles qui n'utilisent que l'article lui-même sans recourir à aucun mécanisme de vérification des faits ni récupérer de preuves à l'appui. Dans ce travail, nous examinons de plus près ces ensembles de données. Bien qu'ils fournissent tous des ressources précieuses pour les recherches futures, nous observons un certain nombre de problèmes qui peuvent mener à des résultats qui ne se généralisent pas dans des contextes plus réalistes. Plus précisément, nous montrons que le biais de sélection lors de la collecte de données entraîne des artefacts indésirables dans les ensembles de données. En outre, alors que la plupart des systèmes entraînent et prédisent au niveau des articles individuels, le chevauchement des sources d'articles dans les données de formation et d'évaluation peut constituer un facteur de confusion important que les modèles peuvent exploiter. En présence de ce facteur de confusion, les modèles peuvent atteindre de bonnes performances en mémorisant directement le mappage des étiquettes de site au lieu de modéliser la tâche réelle de détection d'actualités peu fiables. Nous avons observé une baisse significative (10\xa0%) de la précision pour tous les modèles testés dans une division propre sans chevauchement train/source d'essai. À l'aide des observations et des résultats expérimentaux, nous fournissons des suggestions pratiques sur la façon de créer des ensembles de données plus fiables pour la tâche de détection d'actualités non fiables. Nous suggérons que la création future de jeux de données inclue un modèle simple comme sonde de difficulté/biais et que le développement futur du modèle utilise un site propre et une division de date sans chevauchement.", 'ar': 'يعد الكشف التلقائي عن الأخبار غير الموثوق بها مشكلة بحثية ذات تأثير محتمل كبير. في الآونة الأخيرة ، أظهرت العديد من الأوراق نتائج واعدة على مجموعات بيانات إخبارية واسعة النطاق مع نماذج تستخدم المقالة نفسها فقط دون اللجوء إلى أي آلية للتحقق من الحقائق أو استرداد أي أدلة داعمة. في هذا العمل ، نلقي نظرة فاحصة على مجموعات البيانات هذه. بينما توفر جميعها موارد قيمة للبحث في المستقبل ، فإننا نلاحظ عددًا من المشكلات التي قد تؤدي إلى نتائج لا يتم تعميمها في أوضاع أكثر واقعية. على وجه التحديد ، نظهر أن تحيز الاختيار أثناء جمع البيانات يؤدي إلى نتائج غير مرغوب فيها في مجموعات البيانات. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، بينما تقوم معظم الأنظمة بالتدريب والتنبؤ على مستوى المقالات الفردية ، فإن مصادر المقالات المتداخلة في بيانات التدريب والتقييم يمكن أن توفر عاملًا محيرًا قويًا يمكن للنماذج استغلاله. في ظل وجود هذا العامل المربك ، يمكن للنماذج تحقيق أداء جيد عن طريق حفظ خرائط تسمية الموقع مباشرةً بدلاً من نمذجة المهمة الحقيقية المتمثلة في اكتشاف الأخبار غير الموثوق بها. لاحظنا انخفاضًا كبيرًا (10٪) في الدقة لجميع النماذج التي تم اختبارها في انقسام نظيف مع عدم تداخل مصدر التدريب / الاختبار. باستخدام الملاحظات والنتائج التجريبية ، نقدم اقتراحات عملية حول كيفية إنشاء مجموعات بيانات أكثر موثوقية لمهمة الكشف عن الأخبار غير الموثوق بها. نقترح أن يتضمن إنشاء مجموعة بيانات مستقبلية نموذجًا بسيطًا مثل مسبار الصعوبة / التحيز ، ويستخدم تطوير النموذج المستقبلي موقعًا نظيفًا غير متداخل وتقسيم التاريخ.', 'es': 'La detección automática de noticias poco fiables es un problema de investigación con un gran impacto potencial. Recientemente, varios artículos han mostrado resultados prometedores en conjuntos de datos de noticias a gran escala con modelos que solo utilizan el artículo en sí sin recurrir a ningún mecanismo de verificación de datos ni recuperar ninguna evidencia de apoyo. En este trabajo, analizaremos más de cerca estos conjuntos de datos. Si bien todos proporcionan recursos valiosos para futuras investigaciones, observamos una serie de problemas que pueden conducir a resultados que no se generalizan en entornos más realistas. Específicamente, mostramos que el sesgo de selección durante la recopilación de datos conduce a artefactos no deseados en los conjuntos de datos. Además, si bien la mayoría de los sistemas entrenan y predicen a nivel de artículos individuales, la superposición de fuentes de artículos en los datos de capacitación y evaluación puede proporcionar un fuerte factor de confusión que los modelos pueden aprovechar. En presencia de este factor de confusión, los modelos pueden lograr un buen rendimiento memorizando directamente el mapeo de la etiqueta del sitio en lugar de modelar la verdadera tarea de la detección de noticias poco fiables. Observamos una caída significativa (10%) en la precisión de todos los modelos probados en una división limpia sin solapamiento entre el tren y la fuente de prueba. Utilizando las observaciones y los resultados experimentales, ofrecemos sugerencias prácticas sobre cómo crear conjuntos de datos más fiables para la tarea de detección de noticias poco fiables. Sugerimos que la creación futura de conjuntos de datos incluya un modelo simple como una sonda de dificultad/sesgo y el desarrollo futuro del modelo utilice un sitio limpio y sin solapamiento y división de fechas', 'zh': '自不可恃新闻检者,大潜也。 近者,数篇论文大新闻数据集上示有希望,其模形仅用文身,而不诉诸事实检求证据。 于此,臣等详之。 虽然他们都为未来的研究了宝贵的资源,但我们观察到许多事可以得到更见的境界中不能推广。 具体来说者,所以明数之偏差,而数集之伪影也。 此外虽多系统于单文,而训练评估数据之重者文章源或资模形可用之强以杂之。 夫存乎混杂者,模则记之站点标射而不可恃新闻检之实建模以成善性也。 臣等观之,于未练/试源重叠者,于净拆分中所有模样准确性显降(10%)。 以观实验,资以不可恃新闻检创可凭之数。 臣等议未来之数集创一简为难度/偏差探测器,未来之模开用净非重站点与日分。', 'ja': '自動信頼性の低いニュース検出は、大きな影響を与える可能性のある研究上の問題です。 最近、いくつかの論文は、事実確認のメカニズムを利用したり、裏付けとなる証拠を取得することなく、記事自体のみを使用するモデルを持つ大規模なニュースデータセットで有望な結果を示しています。 この作業では、これらのデータセットを詳しく見ていきます。 これらはすべて、将来の研究のための貴重なリソースを提供しますが、より現実的な場面で一般化されない結果につながる可能性のあるいくつかの問題を観察します。 具体的には、データ収集中の選択バイアスが、データセット内の望ましくないアーチファクトにつながることを示しています。 加えて、ほとんどのシステムは個々の記事のレベルでトレーニングおよび予測しますが、トレーニングおよび評価データ内の重複した記事ソースは、モデルが利用できる強力な混乱要因を提供することができます。 この混乱要因が存在する場合、モデルは、信頼できないニュース検出の実際のタスクをモデリングする代わりに、サイトラベルマッピングを直接記憶することによって、良好なパフォーマンスを達成することができる。 列車/試験ソースが重複していないクリーンな分割で試験したすべてのモデルで、精度が有意に低下する（ 10 ％ ）ことを観察しました。 観察結果と実験結果を使用して、信頼性の低いニュース検出タスクのために、より信頼性の高いデータセットを作成する方法について、実用的な提案を提供します。 将来のデータセット作成には、難易度/バイアスプローブとしての単純なモデルを含めることをお勧めします。将来のモデル開発では、クリーンで重複しない部位と日付の分割を使用します。', 'hi': 'स्वचालित अविश्वसनीय समाचार का पता लगाना महान संभावित प्रभाव के साथ एक शोध समस्या है। हाल ही में, कई पत्रों ने मॉडल के साथ बड़े पैमाने पर समाचार डेटासेट पर आशाजनक परिणाम दिखाए हैं जो केवल किसी भी तथ्य-जांच तंत्र का सहारा लिए बिना या किसी भी सहायक साक्ष्य को पुनर्प्राप्त किए बिना लेख का उपयोग करते हैं। इस काम में, हम इन डेटासेट पर करीब से नज़र डालते हैं। जबकि वे सभी भविष्य के शोध के लिए मूल्यवान संसाधन प्रदान करते हैं, हम कई समस्याओं का निरीक्षण करते हैं जो परिणामों को जन्म दे सकते हैं जो अधिक यथार्थवादी सेटिंग्स में सामान्यीकृत नहीं होते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम दिखाते हैं कि डेटा संग्रह के दौरान चयन पूर्वाग्रह डेटासेट में अवांछित कलाकृतियों की ओर जाता है। इसके अलावा, जबकि अधिकांश सिस्टम व्यक्तिगत लेखों के स्तर पर प्रशिक्षित और भविष्यवाणी करते हैं, प्रशिक्षण और मूल्यांकन डेटा में ओवरलैपिंग लेख स्रोत एक मजबूत भ्रमित कारक प्रदान कर सकते हैं जो मॉडल का शोषण कर सकते हैं। इस confounding कारक की उपस्थिति में, मॉडल अविश्वसनीय समाचार का पता लगाने के वास्तविक कार्य मॉडलिंग के बजाय साइट-लेबल मैपिंग को सीधे याद करके अच्छा प्रदर्शन प्राप्त कर सकते हैं। हमने बिना किसी ट्रेन / परीक्षण स्रोत ओवरलैप के साथ एक साफ विभाजन में परीक्षण किए गए सभी मॉडलों के लिए सटीकता में एक महत्वपूर्ण गिरावट (10%) देखी। टिप्पणियों और प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों का उपयोग करते हुए, हम अविश्वसनीय समाचार का पता लगाने के कार्य के लिए अधिक विश्वसनीय डेटासेट बनाने के तरीके पर व्यावहारिक सुझाव प्रदान करते हैं। हम सुझाव देते हैं कि भविष्य के डेटासेट निर्माण में एक कठिनाई / पूर्वाग्रह जांच के रूप में एक सरल मॉडल शामिल है और भविष्य के मॉडल विकास में एक स्वच्छ गैर-ओवरलैपिंग साइट और दिनांक विभाजन का उपयोग किया जाता है।', 'ru': 'Автоматическое обнаружение недостоверных новостей - это исследовательская проблема с большим потенциальным воздействием. Недавно в нескольких работах были показаны многообещающие результаты по крупномасштабным наборам данных новостей с моделями, которые используют только саму статью, не прибегая к какому-либо механизму проверки фактов или получению каких-либо подтверждающих доказательств. В этой работе мы более подробно рассмотрим эти наборы данных. Хотя все они обеспечивают ценные ресурсы для будущих исследований, мы наблюдаем ряд проблем, которые могут привести к результатам, которые не обобщаются в более реалистичных условиях. В частности, мы показываем, что смещение выбора при сборе данных приводит к нежелательным артефактам в наборах данных. Кроме того, хотя большинство систем обучают и прогнозируют на уровне отдельных статей, дублирование источников статей в данных об обучении и оценке может стать мощным искажающим фактором, который могут использовать модели. При наличии этого мешающего фактора модели могут достичь хорошей производительности, непосредственно запоминая отображение метки сайта, а не моделируя реальную задачу ненадежного обнаружения новостей. Мы наблюдали значительное падение (10%) точности для всех моделей, протестированных в чистом сплите без перекрытия поезда/источника тестирования. Используя результаты наблюдений и экспериментов, мы даем практические предложения о том, как создать более надежные наборы данных для задачи выявления недостоверных новостей. Мы предлагаем создать в будущем набор данных, включающий простую модель в качестве зонда сложности/смещения, а при разработке будущей модели использовать чистую неперекрывающуюся площадку и разбивку даты.', 'ga': 'Is fadhb taighde é braite nuachta neamhiontaofa uathoibríoch a bhfuil tionchar mór féideartha aige. Le déanaí, léirigh go leor páipéar torthaí geallta ar thacair sonraí nuachta ar mhórscála le samhlacha nach n-úsáideann ach an t-alt féin gan dul i muinín aon mheicníocht seiceála fíricí nó aon fhianaise tacaíochta a aisghabháil. Sa obair seo, déanaimid breathnú níos géire ar na tacair sonraí seo. Cé go soláthraíonn siad go léir acmhainní luachmhara le haghaidh taighde amach anseo, tugaimid faoi deara roinnt fadhbanna a bhféadfadh torthaí a bheith mar thoradh orthu nach ginearálú i suíomhanna níos réadúla. Go sonrach, léirímid go mbíonn déantúsáin neamh-inmhianaithe sna tacair sonraí mar thoradh ar chlaonadh roghnúcháin le linn bailiú sonraí. Ina theannta sin, cé go ndéanann formhór na gcóras oiliúint agus tuar ar leibhéal na n-alt aonair, féadfaidh foinsí airteagal forluiteacha sna sonraí oiliúna agus meastóireachta fachtóir láidir inbhréagnaithe a sholáthar ar féidir le samhlacha leas a bhaint astu. I láthair na tosca mearbhall seo, is féidir leis na samhlacha dea-fheidhmíocht a bhaint amach tríd an léarscáiliú lipéad an tsuímh a chur de ghlanmheabhair go díreach seachas samhaltú a dhéanamh ar an bhfíor-thasc maidir le nuacht neamhiontaofa a bhrath. Thugamar faoi deara titim shuntasach (10%) ar chruinneas na múnlaí go léir a tástáladh i scoilt ghlan gan aon fhorluí traenach/foinse tástála. Agus na breathnuithe agus na torthaí turgnamhacha á n-úsáid againn, cuirimid moltaí praiticiúla ar fáil maidir le conas tacair shonraí níos iontaofa a chruthú don tasc neamhiontaofa braite nuachta. Molaimid go n-áireofaí samhail shimplí le cruthú tacar sonraí sa todhchaí mar iniúchadh deacrachta/laofachta agus úsáid a bhaint as suíomh glan neamhfhorluiteach agus scoilt dáta le forbairt samhail sa todhchaí.', 'hu': 'Az automatikus megbízhatatlan hírek felismerése nagy potenciális hatással bíró kutatási probléma. A közelmúltban több cikk ígéretes eredményeket mutatott be nagyszabású híradatkészletekben olyan modellekkel, amelyek csak magát a cikket használják anélkül, hogy bármilyen tényellenőrzési mechanizmust alkalmaznának, vagy bármilyen alátámasztó bizonyítékot találnának. Ebben a munkában közelebbről megvizsgáljuk ezeket az adatkészleteket. Bár mindegyik értékes erőforrást biztosít a jövőbeli kutatáshoz, számos problémát figyelünk meg, amelyek eredményekhez vezethetnek, amelyek nem általánosítanak reálisabb környezetben. Konkrétan azt mutatjuk, hogy az adatgyűjtés során a kiválasztási előírások nem kívánt műtárgyakhoz vezetnek az adatkészletekben. Ezenkívül, míg a legtöbb rendszer az egyes cikkek szintjén képezi és előrejelzi, a képzési és értékelési adatokban található cikkforrások átfedő cikkforrások erőteljes zavaró tényezőt biztosíthatnak, amelyet a modellek kihasználhatnak. Ennek a zavaró tényezőnek a jelenlétében a modellek jó teljesítményt érhetnek el azzal, hogy közvetlenül memorizálják a site-label leképezést, ahelyett, hogy modelleznék a megbízhatatlan hírek felismerésének valódi feladatát. A pontosság jelentős csökkenését (10%) figyeltük meg minden olyan modell esetében, amelyet tiszta osztásban teszteltünk, vonat/tesztforrás átfedése nélkül. A megfigyelések és kísérleti eredmények felhasználásával gyakorlati javaslatokat adunk arra vonatkozóan, hogyan lehet megbízhatóbb adatkészleteket készíteni a megbízhatatlan hírek felismeréséhez. Javasoljuk, hogy a jövőbeli adatkészlet létrehozása tartalmazzon egy egyszerű modellt nehézség/elfordulás szondáként, a jövőbeli modellfejlesztés pedig tiszta, nem átfedő webhelyet és dátumfelosztást használjon.', 'el': 'Η αυτόματη αναξιόπιστη ανίχνευση ειδήσεων είναι ένα ερευνητικό πρόβλημα με μεγάλο πιθανό αντίκτυπο. Πρόσφατα, αρκετές εργασίες έχουν δείξει πολλά υποσχόμενα αποτελέσματα σε μεγάλα σύνολα δεδομένων ειδήσεων με μοντέλα που χρησιμοποιούν μόνο το ίδιο το άρθρο χωρίς να καταφεύγουν σε κανέναν μηχανισμό ελέγχου γεγονότων ή να ανακτήσουν οποιαδήποτε υποστηρικτική απόδειξη. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εξετάζουμε πιο προσεκτικά αυτά τα σύνολα δεδομένων. Ενώ όλα παρέχουν πολύτιμους πόρους για μελλοντική έρευνα, παρατηρούμε μια σειρά προβλημάτων που μπορεί να οδηγήσουν σε αποτελέσματα που δεν γενικεύονται σε πιο ρεαλιστικά πλαίσια. Συγκεκριμένα, δείχνουμε ότι η προκατάληψη επιλογής κατά τη συλλογή δεδομένων οδηγεί σε ανεπιθύμητα τεχνουργήματα στα σύνολα δεδομένων. Επιπλέον, ενώ τα περισσότερα συστήματα εκπαιδεύονται και προβλέπουν σε επίπεδο μεμονωμένων άρθρων, οι επικαλυπτόμενες πηγές άρθρων στα δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης και αξιολόγησης μπορούν να παρέχουν έναν ισχυρό παράγοντα σύγχυσης που μπορούν να εκμεταλλευτούν τα μοντέλα. Με την παρουσία αυτού του συγκλονιστικού παράγοντα, τα μοντέλα μπορούν να επιτύχουν καλή απόδοση απομνημονεύοντας άμεσα τη χαρτογράφηση ετικετών τοποθεσίας αντί να μοντελοποιούν το πραγματικό έργο της αναξιόπιστης ανίχνευσης ειδήσεων. Παρατηρήσαμε σημαντική πτώση (10%) στην ακρίβεια για όλα τα μοντέλα που εξετάστηκαν σε καθαρό διαχωρισμό χωρίς αλληλεπικάλυψη αμαξοστοιχίας/πηγής δοκιμής. Χρησιμοποιώντας τις παρατηρήσεις και τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα, παρέχουμε πρακτικές προτάσεις για το πώς να δημιουργήσετε πιο αξιόπιστα σύνολα δεδομένων για την αναξιόπιστη εργασία ανίχνευσης ειδήσεων. Προτείνουμε τη μελλοντική δημιουργία συνόλων δεδομένων να περιλαμβάνει ένα απλό μοντέλο ως έλεγχο δυσκολίας/προκατάλειψης και μελλοντική ανάπτυξη μοντέλων να χρησιμοποιεί μια καθαρή μη επικαλυπτόμενη τοποθεσία και κατανομή ημερομηνιών.', 'it': "Il rilevamento automatico di notizie inaffidabili è un problema di ricerca con grande impatto potenziale. Recentemente, diversi articoli hanno mostrato risultati promettenti su set di notizie su larga scala con modelli che utilizzano solo l'articolo stesso senza ricorrere a alcun meccanismo di verifica dei fatti o recuperare alcuna prova a sostegno. In questo lavoro, diamo un'occhiata più da vicino a questi set di dati. Mentre tutti forniscono risorse preziose per la ricerca futura, osserviamo una serie di problemi che possono portare a risultati che non si generalizzano in contesti più realistici. Nello specifico, mostriamo che gli errori di selezione durante la raccolta dei dati portano a artefatti indesiderati nei set di dati. Inoltre, mentre la maggior parte dei sistemi si allena e predice a livello di singoli articoli, la sovrapposizione di fonti di articoli nei dati di formazione e valutazione può fornire un forte fattore di confusione che i modelli possono sfruttare. In presenza di questo fattore di confusione, i modelli possono ottenere buone prestazioni memorizzando direttamente la mappatura site-label invece di modellare il vero compito di rilevamento di notizie inaffidabili. Abbiamo osservato un calo significativo (10%) della precisione per tutti i modelli testati in una divisione pulita senza sovrapposizione treno/sorgente di prova. Utilizzando le osservazioni e i risultati sperimentali, forniamo suggerimenti pratici su come creare set di dati più affidabili per l'inaffidabile compito di rilevamento delle notizie. Suggeriamo che la creazione futura di set di dati includa un modello semplice come sonda di difficoltà/bias e che lo sviluppo futuro del modello utilizzi un sito pulito e non sovrapposto e una divisione data.", 'kk': 'Автоматты сенімді емес жаңалықтарды анықтау - мүмкіндік нәрселерді зерттеу мәселесі. Жуырда бірнеше қағаздар жаңалық деректер жиындарының үлкен мақаласының өзінің өзіне тек факты тексеру механизміне көмектесмей не қолдау құлақтарын алмай, үлкен мақалаларының нәтижесін көрсетті. Бұл жұмыста, бұл деректер жиындарына жақын қараймыз. Олар барлығы келесі зерттеулердің маңызды ресурстарын қамтамасыз етіп тұрғанда, біз бірнеше мәселелерді қараймыз, бұл нәтижелерді бірнеше реалистикалық параметрлерде жа Мәлімет, деректер жинақтауындағы таңдаулардың көлемі деректер жинақтарындағы артефакттарды көрсетеді. Қосымша, жүйелердің көпшілігі жеке мақалалардың деңгейінде ұқсас және алдын алады, мақалалардың көпшілігін оқыту және оқыту деректерінің көпшілігі үлгілерін қолдануға мүмкі Бұл қиыншылық фактордың барлығында, үлгілер сайт жарлығын көрсету үшін, сенімсіз жаңалықтарды анықтау үшін, шын тапсырманы моделдеу орнына, сайт жарлығын көрсету үшін жақсы істеу мү Біз бүкіл үлгілерді тазалау үшін дұрыс (10%) дегенді көрдік. Түй/ сынақ көзі қайталап тұрмаған тұрақты бөлісті. Бақылау мен тәжірибелі нәтижелерді қолдану үшін, сенімді емес жаңалық анықтау тапсырмасының қалай сенімді деректер жинақтарын құру үшін практикалық тапсырмалар береміз. Біз келесі деректер қорларын құру үшін қарапайым үлгісін қолдануға ұсынамыз. Қатысылық/қарапайым тәжірибесін және келесі үлгісін жасау үлгісін тазалау сайтына ж', 'mk': 'Автоматското недоверливо детекција на вести е истражувачки проблем со голем потенцијален влијание. Recently, several papers have shown promising results on large-scale news datasets with models that only use the article itself without resorting to any fact-checking mechanism or retrieving any supporting evidence.  Во оваа работа, ги погледнуваме подалеку овие податоци. Иако сите тие обезбедуваат вредни ресурси за идното истражување, ние набљудуваме голем број проблеми кои може да доведат до резултати кои не се генерализираат во пореални услови. Специфично, покажуваме дека селекционите предрасуди за време на собирањето на податоци водат до нежелни артефакти во податоците. Покрај тоа, додека повеќето системи обучуваат и предвидуваат на ниво на индивидуални статии, копирањето на изворите на статии во податоците за обука и евалуација може да обезбеди силен збунувачки фактор кој моделите можат да го искористат. Во присуство на овој збунувачки фактор, моделите можат да постигнат добра резултат со директно споменување на мапирањето на локалната етикета наместо моделирање на вистинската задача на недоверлива детекција на вести. Набљудувавме значителен пад (10 %) во точноста за сите модели тестирани во чиста поделба без прекривање на изворот на воз/тест. Користејќи ги набљудувањата и експерименталните резултати, обезбедуваме практични предлози за тоа како да се создадат подоверливи податоци за недоверливата задача за детекција на вести. Ние предлагаме идното создавање на податоци да вклучи едноставен модел како тешко/предрасудување сонда и идниот развој на моделот да користи чисто непокупирачко место и поделба на датумите.', 'ka': 'ავტომატურად შეუძლებელი ინფორმაცია იქნება პრობლემა, რომელიც დიდი პოტენციალური ეფექტი აქვს. მხოლოდ, რამდენიმე დოკუმენტები მონაცემების შესახებ დიდი მანქანის მონაცემების შესახებ, რომელიც მხოლოდ მანქანტის თავისთვის გამოყენება, არც ფაქტის შემოწმების მექანსის გადა ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ უფრო მეტი დავხედავთ ამ მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია. თუმცა ისინი ყველას უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი რესურსი მომავალეთ სწავლებისთვის, ჩვენ შევხედავთ რამდენიმე პრობლემები, რომლებიც შეიძლება გავაკეთოთ შედეგი,  განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენებთ, რომ მონიშნულება მონაცემების კოლექციაში არჩეულებული არტიფექტაქტებს მონაცემების კ დამატებით, მაგრამ უფრო სისტემები განვითარება და განვითარება ინდიველური წესების დონეში, საკუთარი წესების სისტემების შესაძლებლობად განვითარება და განვითარება მონაცემების შესაძლებლო ამ კონფლიქციური ფაქტორის სახელში, მოდელები შეუძლიათ წარმოიდგინოთ კარგი გამოსახულება, პირდაპირად დახმარებით საიტის მარტიკაციის მარტიკაციის ნაცვლად მარტიკაციის რეალური ჩვენ შევხედავთ მნიშვნელოვანი კონფიგურაცია (10%) ყველა მოდელში, რომელიც წარმოიცემულია წარმოიცემულია, რომელიც არაფერი გრანს/ტესტის ფორმა გა მონაცემებები და ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგების გამოყენება, ჩვენ პრაქტიკური საზოგადოება როგორ უფრო დარწმუნებელი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციას შექმნა უ ჩვენ მოგვეძლოთ მომავალე მონაცემების შექმნა უფრო მარტივი მოდელი, როგორც შესაძლებლობა/ბუშაობის მოდელური განვითარება და მომავალური მოდელური განვითარება გამოყენება', 'ms': 'Automatic unreliable news detection is a research problem with great potential impact.  Baru-baru ini, beberapa kertas telah menunjukkan keputusan yang berjanji pada set data berita skala besar dengan model yang hanya menggunakan artikel sendiri tanpa menggunakan mana-mana mekanisme pemeriksaan fakta atau mengambil sebarang bukti sokongan. Dalam kerja ini, kita melihat lebih dekat set data ini. Sementara mereka menyediakan sumber berharga untuk kajian masa depan, kita mengamati beberapa masalah yang mungkin membawa kepada keputusan yang tidak menyeluruhkan dalam tetapan yang lebih realistik. Secara khusus, kita tunjukkan bias pemilihan semasa koleksi data membawa kepada artefak tidak diinginkan dalam set data. Selain itu, sementara kebanyakan sistem melatih dan meramalkan pada aras artikel individu, sumber artikel yang meliputi dalam data latihan dan penilaian boleh menyediakan faktor yang mengecewakan yang kuat yang model boleh mengeksploitasi. Dalam kehadiran faktor kekacauan ini, model boleh mencapai prestasi yang baik dengan mengingati secara langsung pemetaan label-laman selain daripada memmodelkan tugas sebenar pengesan berita yang tidak dipercayai. Kami memerhatikan titik yang signifikan (10%) dalam ketepatan untuk semua model yang diuji dalam bahagian bersih tanpa sebarang sumber kereta api/ujian. Menggunakan pengamatan dan hasil eksperimen, kami memberikan cadangan praktik bagaimana untuk mencipta set data yang lebih dipercayai untuk tugas pengesan berita yang tidak dipercayai. Kami cadangkan penciptaan set data masa depan mengandungi model sederhana sebagai sond kesulitan/bias dan pembangunan model masa depan menggunakan laman yang bersih yang tidak meliputi dan bahagian tarikh.', 'mt': 'L-iskoperta awtomatika tal-a ħbarijiet mhux affidabbli hija problem a ta’ riċerka b’impatt potenzjali kbir. Dan l-aħħar, diversi dokumenti wrew riżultati promettenti fuq settijiet ta’ dejta tal-aħbarijiet fuq skala kbira b’mudelli li jużaw biss l-artikolu nnifsu mingħajr ma jirrikorru għal kwalunkwe mekkaniżmu ta’ verifika tal-fatti jew jirċievu kwalunkwe evidenza ta’ appoġġ. F’dan ix-xogħol, a ħna nħarsu aktar mill-qrib lejn dawn is-settijiet ta’ dejta. Filwaqt li dawn kollha jipprovdu riżorsi ta’ valur għar-riċerka futura, a ħna nużaw għadd ta’ problemi li jistgħu jwasslu għal riżultati li ma jiġġeneralizzawx f’ambjenti aktar realistiċi. B’mod speċifiku, nuru li l-preġudizzju tal-għażla matul il-ġbir tad-dejta jwassal għal artifatti mhux mixtieqa fis-settijiet tad-dejta. Barra minn hekk, filwaqt li l-biċċa l-kbira tas-sistemi jitħarrġu u jipprevedu fil-livell ta’ oġġetti individwali, sorsi ta’ oġġetti li jikkoinċidu fid-dejta tat-taħriġ u l-evalwazzjoni jistgħu jipprovdu fattur qawwi li jfixkel li l-mudelli jistgħu jisfruttaw. Fil-preżenza ta’ dan il-fattur ta’ konfużjoni, il-mudelli jistgħu jiksbu prestazzjoni tajba billi jimmemorizzaw direttament l-immappjar tat-tikketta tas-sit minflok jimmudellaw il-kompitu reali ta’ sejbien ta’ aħbarijiet mhux affidabbli. We observed a significant drop (10%) in accuracy for all models tested in a clean split with no train/test source overlap.  Bl-użu tal-osservazzjonijiet u r-riżultati sperimentali, nagħtu suġġerimenti prattiċi dwar kif jinħolqu settijiet ta’ dejta aktar affidabbli għall-kompitu ta’ individwazzjoni tal-aħbarijiet mhux affidabbli. Aħna ssuġġerixxu li l-ħolqien futur ta’ sett ta’ dejta jinkludi mudell sempliċi bħala sonda ta’ diffikultà/preġudizzju u żvilupp futur ta’ mudell juża sit nadif li ma jikkoinċidix u qsim tad-data.', 'mn': 'Автоматик итгэлтгүй мэдээг олох нь хамгийн их нөлөөтэй судалгааны асуудал юм. Саяхан хэд хэдэн сонинууд маш их хэмжээний мэдээллийн сангуудын үр дүнг харуулсан. Зөвхөн өгөгдлийн сангуудыг зөвхөн өөрийгөө ашиглаж байгаа загварууд нь ямар ч үнэндээ шалгах механизм эсвэл дэмжиж буй баримтууд Энэ ажил дээр бид эдгээр өгөгдлийн сангуудыг илүү ойрхон харж байна. Тэд бүгд ирээдүйн судалгаанд үнэ цэнэтэй баялаг хангадаг ч, бид олон асуудлуудыг харж болно. Энэ нь илүү бодит байдлаар ерөнхийлөгүй үр дүнд хүргэж чадахгүй. Бид мэдээллийн цуглуулалтын үед сонголтын алдаа алдаа нь өгөгдлийн хэлбэрээр хэрэглэгдэхгүй артифактуудыг харуулж байна. Түүнчлэн ихэнх системийн сургалтын хөдөлгөөн, хувийн бичгийн түвшинд таамаглаж, сургалтын болон үнэлгээний өгөгдлийн эх үүсвэрүүдийг давхарлах нь загварын ашиглаж чадах маш гайхалтай хүчин зүйлийг хангаж болно. Энэ аймшигтай хүчин зүйл байхдаа загварууд сайтын загварын газрын зураг шууд санаж чадах боломжтой. Бид бүх загваруудыг цэвэр хуваалцахдаа шалгалтын тодорхой (10%) бууруулж байлаа. Төв/тест эх үүсвэрийг дутагдахгүй. Үүнийг харуулж, туршилтын үр дүнг ашиглан бид мэдээллийг олох ажлын тухай илүү итгэлтэй өгөгдлийн сангуудыг хэрхэн бий болгох талаар практикийн санал өгдөг. Бид ирээдүйн өгөгдлийн санг бүтээх нь хэцүү/хэцүү судалгаа болон ирээдүйн загварын хөгжүүлэлтийг цэвэрхэн хуваагдахгүй сайт болон цаг хуваагдах энгийн загвар юм.', 'ml': 'സ്വയം വിശ്വാസമില്ലാത്ത വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് വളരെ സാധ്യതയുള്ള പ്രഭാവം തന്നെയാണ്. Recently, several papers have shown promising results on large-scale news datasets with models that only use the article itself without resorting to any fact-checking mechanism or retrieving any supporting evidence.  ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമുക്ക് ഈ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളെ അടുത്ത് നോക്കാം. അവരെല്ലാം ഭാവിയുടെ പരിശോധനത്തിന് വിലപ്പെട്ട വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുമ്പോള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കാണുന്നു കുറച്ച് പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d കാണുന്നു.  പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ഡേറ്റാ സംഘത്തില്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പേരില്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റില കൂടാതെ, കൂടുതല്\u200d സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d പലരും വ്യക്തിപരമായ രേഖകളില്\u200d ട്രെയിന്\u200d ചെയ്യുകയും പ്രവചിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുമ്പോള്\u200d, പരിശീലനത്തിലും പരിശീലനത്തിലും  ഈ കുഴപ്പമില്ലാത്ത കാര്യത്തിന്റെ സന്നിധിയില്\u200d, സൈറ്റ് ലേബ് മാപ്പിങ്ങ് നേരെ ഓര്\u200dമ്മിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനു പകരം മോഡലുകള്\u200d നല്ല പ്രകടനം  ട്രെയിന്\u200d/ടെസ്റ്റ് സോര്\u200dസ് മേല്\u200dപ്പ് ഇല്ലാതെ പരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട എല്ലാ മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കും വ്യക്തമായ ഒരു പ്രാധാന്യമാ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങളും ഉപയോഗിച്ച്, വിശ്വസിക്കാത്ത വാര്\u200dത്തകളുടെ ജോലിക്ക് എങ്ങനെയാണ് കൂടുതല്\u200d വിശ്വസ്തമായ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d ഉണ ഭാവിയുടെ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു എളുപ്പമായ മോഡല്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതാണെന്ന് നാം ആലോചിക്കുന്നു. പ്രയാസകരമായ പ', 'lt': 'Automatinis nepatikimas naujienų aptikimas yra didelio poveikio mokslinių tyrimų problem a. Recently, several papers have shown promising results on large-scale news datasets with models that only use the article itself without resorting to any fact-checking mechanism or retrieving any supporting evidence.  Šiame darbe atidžiau pažvelgiame į šiuos duomenų rinkinius. Nors jie visi suteikia vertingų išteklių būsimiems moksliniams tyrimams, mes pastebime keletą problemų, dėl kurių gali atsirasti rezultatų, kurie nėra bendresni tikroviškesnėse aplinkybėse. Specifically, we show that selection bias during data collection leads to undesired artifacts in the datasets.  Be to, nors dauguma sistemų rengia ir prognozuoja atskirų straipsnių lygmeniu, sutampantys gaminių šaltiniai mokymo ir vertinimo duomenise gali būti tvirtas sumaišantis veiksnys, kurį modeliai gali panaudoti. In the presence of this confounding factor, the models can achieve good performance by directly memorizing the site-label mapping instead of modeling the real task of unreliable news detection.  We observed a significant drop (10%) in accuracy for all models tested in a clean split with no train/test source overlap.  Naudodamiesi stebėjimais ir eksperimentiniais rezultatais, teikiame praktinius pasiūlymus, kaip sukurti patikimesnius duomenų rinkinius nepatikimoms naujienų aptikimo užduotims. We suggest future dataset creation include a simple model as a difficulty/bias probe and future model development use a clean non-overlapping site and date split.', 'pl': 'Automatyczne niewiarygodne wykrywanie wiadomości to problem badawczy o dużym potencjalnym wpływie. Ostatnio kilka artykułów pokazało obiecujące wyniki na dużej skali zbiorach danych wiadomości z modelami, które wykorzystują tylko sam artykuł bez uciekania się do mechanizmu sprawdzania faktów lub pobierania jakichkolwiek potwierdzających dowodów. W niniejszej pracy przyjrzymy się bliżej tym zbiorom danych. Chociaż wszystkie one stanowią cenne zasoby dla przyszłych badań, obserwujemy szereg problemów, które mogą prowadzić do wyników, które nie uogólniają się w bardziej realistycznych warunkach. W szczególności pokazujemy, że białość selekcji podczas gromadzenia danych prowadzi do niepożądanych artefaktów w zbiorach danych. Ponadto, podczas gdy większość systemów trenuje i przewiduje na poziomie poszczególnych artykułów, nakładające się źródła artykułów w danych szkoleniowych i oceniających mogą zapewnić silny czynnik zakłócający, który modele mogą wykorzystać. W obecności tego czynnika zakłócającego modele mogą osiągnąć dobrą wydajność poprzez bezpośrednie zapamiętywanie mapowania etykiet witryny zamiast modelowania rzeczywistego zadania niewiarygodnego wykrywania wiadomości. Zaobserwowaliśmy znaczny spadek dokładności (10%) dla wszystkich testowanych modeli w czystym podziałie bez nakładania się źródła pociągu/badania. Korzystając z obserwacji i wyników eksperymentalnych, przedstawiamy praktyczne sugestie, jak stworzyć bardziej wiarygodne zbiory danych dla zadania niewiarygodnego wykrywania wiadomości. Proponujemy tworzenie przyszłych zbiorów danych obejmować prosty model jako sondę trudności/uprzedzenia, a przyszły model wykorzystać czysty, nienakładający się na siebie podział witryny i daty.', 'no': 'Automatisk ukjengeleg nytt er eit forskningsproblem med stor potensielt effekt. Nyleg har fleire papir vist promiserende resultat på stor skala nyhetsdata med modeller som berre brukar artikkelen sjølv utan å korta til nokon faktisk sjekkingsmekanisme eller henta alle støttande beviser. I dette arbeidet ser vi nærmere på desse datasettene. Selv om dei alle tilbyr verdilege ressursar for framtidige forskning, vi observerer fleire problemar som kan føre til resultat som ikkje generelliserer i meir realistiske innstillingar. Spesielt viser vi at utvalsforskyvinga ved datasamlinga fører til ugjennomsiktige artifaktar i datasettet. I tillegg, mens dei fleste systemtogar og foregår på nivået av individuelle artiklar, kan overlappa artikkelkjeldene i opplæring og evalueringsdata gi ein sterk konfliktentisk faktor som modeller kan bruka. I tillegg til denne konformende faktoren kan modelane oppnå godt utvikling ved å minne nettmerkelappen direkte i staden for å modelera den verkelege oppgåva for ukjengeleg oppdaging av nyhetar. Vi observerte ein signifikant slepp (10%) i nøyaktighet for alle modeller som testerte i eit rein delt med ingen trekkjelde/testkjeldeoverlapp. Bruk observasjonane og eksperimentelle resultatene, oppgjev vi praktiske forslag om korleis det skal laga meir tilgjengelege datasett for oppgåva for ukjengeleg informasjon. Vi foreslår framtidige oppretting av datasett inneheld ein enkel modell som eit vanskeleg/forskyvingsprobe og framtidige utvikling av modellen brukar ein rein ikkje-overlapping nettstad og delt dato.', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje automatske nevjerojatne vesti je problem istraživanja sa velikim potencijalnim utjecajem. Nedavno, nekoliko papira pokazalo je obećavajuće rezultate na velikim novinskim setima podataka sa modelima koji koriste samo članak bez pristupanja bilo kojem mehanizmu provjere činjenica ili uzmu bilo kakve podrške dokaze. U ovom poslu, bolje pogledamo ove podatke. Dok svi pružaju vrijedne resurse za buduće istraživanje, posmatramo broj problema koji bi mogli dovesti do rezultata koji se ne generalizuju u realnijim nastavama. Posebno, pokazujemo da predrasude izbora tokom kolekcije podataka vodi do neobičnih artifakta u setima podataka. Osim toga, dok većin a sistema vlaka i predviđaju na nivou pojedinačnih članaka, preklapanje izvora članaka u podacima obuke i procjene mogu pružiti jaki konfliktantni faktor koji modeli mogu iskoristiti. U prisustvu ovog smešnog faktora, modeli mogu ostvariti dobru izvedbu direktno sećanjem mapiranja na etiketi site umjesto modeliranja pravih zadataka neodređenog otkrivanja vijesti. Primijetili smo značajnu kap (10%) u točnosti za sve modele testovane u čistom dijelu bez preklapanja izvora vlaka/test a. Koristeći posmatranja i eksperimentalne rezultate, pružamo praktične predloge o tome kako da stvorimo pouzdane sete podataka za zadatak otkrivanja neverovatnih vesti. Predlažemo da buduća stvaranja kompleta podataka uključuje jednostavan model kao sonda za poteškoće/predrasude i budući razvoj modela koristi čisto mjesto bez preklapanja i podeljenje datuma.', 'ro': 'Detectarea automată a știrilor nesigure este o problemă de cercetare cu impact potențial mare. Recent, mai multe lucrări au arătat rezultate promițătoare pe seturi de date de știri la scară largă, cu modele care utilizează numai articolul în sine, fără a recurge la niciun mecanism de verificare a faptelor sau recuperarea oricăror dovezi justificative. În această lucrare, ne uităm mai atent la aceste seturi de date. Deși toate acestea oferă resurse valoroase pentru cercetarea viitoare, observăm o serie de probleme care pot duce la rezultate care nu se generalizează în setări mai realiste. Mai exact, arătăm că părtinirea selecției în timpul colectării datelor duce la artefacte nedorite în seturile de date. În plus, în timp ce majoritatea sistemelor se antrenează și prezic la nivelul articolelor individuale, sursele de articole suprapuse în datele de formare și evaluare pot oferi un factor de confuzie puternic pe care modelele îl pot exploata. În prezența acestui factor confuz, modelele pot obține performanțe bune prin memorarea directă a cartografierii site-label în loc să modeleze sarcina reală de detectare a știrilor nesigure. Am observat o scădere semnificativă (10%) a preciziei pentru toate modelele testate într-o divizare curată, fără suprapunere tren/sursă de testare. Folosind observațiile și rezultatele experimentale, oferim sugestii practice cu privire la modul de a crea seturi de date mai fiabile pentru sarcina de detectare a știrilor nesigure. Sugerăm crearea viitoare a seturilor de date să includă un model simplu ca sondă de dificultate/părtinire, iar dezvoltarea viitoare a modelului să folosească un site curat, fără suprapunere și divizarea datelor.', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්වාස කරන්න බැරි වාර්තාව හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න අලුත් වෙලාවේ, විශාල ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විශාල ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරත මේ වැඩේ අපි මේ දත්ත සේට් වලට ගොඩක් බලන්න. ඔවුන් හැමෝම අනාගතයේ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙන්නේ නමුත්, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ විශේෂයෙන්ම, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ දත්ත සංගීතයේ තෝරාගන්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරමයක් තියෙන්නේ දත්ත සෙට් වල අවශ්\u200d ඒ වගේම, බොහෝ පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ අවශ මේ විශාල විශාල විදියට තියෙන්නේ, මොඩේල් එක හොඳ විදියට පුළුවන් හොඳ විදියට ප්\u200dරමාණය හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් සායිට් ලේබ අපි දැක්කා සියළු මොඩේල් එක්ක සුදුසුම් විදිහට පරීක්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ සුදුසුම් විදිහට සුදුසුම් විදිහට ( පරීක්ෂණය සහ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති අපි අනාගතයේ දත්ත සැකසුම් නිර්මාණය කරනවා සාමාන්\u200dය මොඩල් එකක් සම්පූර්ණයි, අනාගතයේ මොඩල් විකාශය සහ අනාගතයේ ප්\u200dරවේ', 'sv': 'Automatisk opålitlig nyhetsdetektering är ett forskningsproblem med stor potentiell påverkan. Nyligen har flera artiklar visat lovande resultat på storskaliga nyhetsdataset med modeller som endast använder själva artikeln utan att tillgripa någon faktakontrolleringsmekanism eller hämta några stödjande bevis. I detta arbete tar vi en närmare titt på dessa dataset. Samtidigt som de alla ger värdefulla resurser för framtida forskning observerar vi ett antal problem som kan leda till resultat som inte generaliserar i mer realistiska miljöer. Specifikt visar vi att selektionsbias under datainsamling leder till oönskade artefakter i datauppsättningarna. Dessutom, medan de flesta system tränar och förutspår på nivå av enskilda artiklar, överlappande artikelkällor i utbildnings- och utvärderingsdata kan ge en stark förvirrande faktor som modeller kan utnyttja. I närvaro av denna förvirrande faktor kan modellerna uppnå bra prestanda genom att direkt memorera platsmärkningen istället för att modellera den verkliga uppgiften med opålitlig nyhetsdetektering. Vi observerade en betydande minskning (10%) av noggrannheten för alla modeller som testades i en ren split utan överlappning mellan tåg och testkälla. Med hjälp av observationer och experimentella resultat ger vi praktiska förslag på hur man skapar mer tillförlitliga dataset för den opålitliga nyhetsdetekteringsuppgiften. Vi föreslår att framtida datauppsättningar inkluderar en enkel modell som en svårighets-/bias prob och framtida modellutveckling använder en ren icke-överlappande webbplats och datumdelning.', 'so': 'Macluumaadka aan la aamin karin waa dhibaato baaritaan ah oo saameyn weyn leh. Dhab ahaantii qaar warqadood ayaa tusay resultooyin ballan ah oo ku saabsan taariikhda macluumaadka oo ballaadhan oo modello ah oo kaliya isticmaalaya qoraalka oo aan isticmaalin meymisyo xaqiiqsiga ah ama helin markhaatiyada taageerada. Shaqadan, waxaan aad u fiirinaynaa sawiradan. Inta ay dhammaantood u fidiyaan hanti qiimaan waxbarashada mustaqbalka ah, waxaynu aragnaa dhibaatooyin badan oo sabab u noqon kara arimaha aan horumarinta xarumaha runta ah. Si gaar ah, waxaynu muujinnaa in doorashooyin baas ah marka lagu soo ururiyo macluumaadka, waxay ku leedahay waxyaabo aan la beddelin sameyn sawirada. Intaas waxaa dheer, marka nidaamka badankoodu ay wax ku tababaraan oo ay wax ku sii sheegaan heerka waxyaabaha gaarka ah, waxay ka sii gudbi karaan koorasyada iyo macluumaadka qiimeynta, waxayna heli karaan waxyaabo adag oo isku mid ah oo sameyn kara. Marka ay jiraan arrintan isku qasnaysan, modellada ayaa si toos ah u xusuusan kara kartooyinka bogagga-label badalka sameynta shuqulka runta ah ee baaritaanka macluumaadka aan la aaminayn. Waxaan si saxda ah u aragnay dhibaaq weyn (10%) simaalada oo dhan oo lagu tijaabiyey goob nadiif ah oo aan lagu daboolin rugta/tijaabada. Sida aan isticmaalno aragtida iyo resultinta imtixaanka, waxaynu fidinaynaa arimo caafimaad ah oo ku saabsan sida loo sameynayo sawirada macluumaadka ee la aamin karo. Waxan ka jeedinaynaa in abuuridda macluumaadka mustaqbalka ah lagu sameeyo tusaale fudud oo ay tahay dhibaato/baaritaanka bias iyo horumarinta qaababka mustaqbalka ah ay isticmaalaan boostada nadiif ah oo aan la beddelin.', 'ta': 'Automatic unreliable news detection is a research problem with great potential impact.  சமீபத்தில், பல தாக்கியங்கள் பெரிய அளவு செய்தி தகவல் அமைப்புகளில் வாக்களிக்கப்பட்ட முடிவுகளை காண்பித்துள்ளார்கள் மாதிரிகளுடன் மட்டும் கட்டுர இந்த வேலையில், நாம் இந்த தகவல் அமைப்புகளை நெருங்கி பார்க்கிறோம். அவர்கள் அனைவரும் எதிர்கால ஆராய்ச்சிக்கு மதிப்புள்ள வளங்களை வழங்கும் போது, நாம் பல பிரச்சினைகளை பார்க்கிறோம். அது மேலு குறிப்பிட்டு, தரவு தொகுப்பில் தேர்ந்தெடுப்பு ஒழுங்குகளை காட்டுகிறோம் என்பது தரவு அமைப்புகளில் கண்டுப மேலும், பெரும்பாலும் அமைப்புகள் தனிப்பட்ட கட்டுரைகளின் நிலையில் பயிற்சி மற்றும் முன்வாக்குதல், பயிற்சி மற்றும் மதிப்பின் தகவலில் கட்டு இந்த காரணியின் முன்னில், மாதிரிகள் சரியான செயல்பாட்டை நேரடியாக நினைவில் கொண்டு பெற முடியும் முறைமைகள் செய்ய முடியாத செய்த நாம் ஒரு முக்கியமான drop (10%) சரியான மாதிரிகளை சரியாக பார்த்தோம் பார்வைகள் மற்றும் சோதனையின் முடிவுகளை பயன்படுத்தி, நாம் எவ்வாறு மேலும் நம்பிக்கை கொள்ள முடியாத செய்தி கண்டுபிடிக நாம் எதிர்கால தரவுத்தளத்தை உருவாக்க ஒரு சுலபமான மாதிரி சேர்க்கும் கடினமான/பியாஸ் தோற்றம் மற்றும் எதிர்கால மாதிரி உருவ', 'ur': 'اٹوٹوٹوٹ غیر قابل اعتماد اخبار شناسایی بہت اثرات کے ساتھ ایک تحقیق مشکل ہے. اچھا، بہت سی کاغذوں نے بڑی نسلی اخبار ڈیٹ سٹ پر ڈرانے والی نتیجے دکھائے ہیں جو موڈل کے ساتھ صرف لکھ کا استعمال کرتے ہیں بغیر کسی حقیقت کی چک مکانیسم کے یا کسی مدد کی مدد کرنے والی دلیلیں حاصل کرتے ہیں. اس کام میں ہم ان ڈیٹسٹوں کو زیادہ قریب دیکھتے ہیں۔ حالانکہ وہ سب مستقبل تحقیقات کے لئے ارزش دار سرمایہ دیتے ہیں، ہم بہت سی مشکلات دیکھتے ہیں جو نتیجے پہنچا سکتے ہیں جو زیادہ حقیقی تنظیمات میں عام نہیں ہوتے۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ڈیٹ کالکیٹ کے درمیان انتخاب غیر منصوبہ ڈیٹ سٹ میں غیر منصوبہ کی آرٹیفٹ کی طرف لے جاتا ہے. اور اس کے علاوہ، اکثر سیستموں کو ترین کرتا ہے اور ایک فرقہ مقررہ مقررہ کے سطح میں پیش بینی کرتا ہے، ترینس اور ارزیابی ڈیٹے میں مقررہ سورج اورلپ کرتا ہے، وہ ایک مضبوط غلط فکتور دے سکتا ہے جو مدلز اسے اضافہ اس غلط فکتور کے حضور موجود، موڈل اچھی فکتوری حاصل کر سکتے ہیں، سئٹ لابلیٹ مکرپینگ کو مستقیما ذکر کر کے بغیر مستقیماً یقین نہیں رکھنے والی خبر شناسایی کے حقیقی کام کو موڈل کر سکتے ہیں. ہم نے تمام نمڈلوں کے لئے ایک بڑی دقیق ڈوب (10%) کو دیکھا تھا جو پاکیزہ تقسیم میں آزمائش کی گئی تھی اور کوئی ٹرین/امتحان سورج اورلپ نہیں ہوئی تھی۔ آزمائش اور آزمائش نتیجے کے مطابق، ہم نے بغیر قابل اعتماد کے کام کے لئے بہت قابل اطمینان کے ڈیٹ سٹ بنانے کے بارے میں فعالیت کی پیشنهاد دیتے ہیں. ہم نے مستقبل ڈاٹ سٹ پیدا کرنے کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ ایک ساده موڈل میں مشکل/بغیر مشکل کے طور پر اور مستقبل موڈل توسعہ کا استعمال کرتا ہے ایک پاک غیر اوورلاپ سٹ اور تاریخ جدائی کے طور پر۔', 'uz': "Avtomatik muvaffaqiyatli xabar aniqlashni tasavvur qilish juda katta muammolar. Yaqinda ko'pchilik hujjatlar juda katta yangiliklar maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi natijalarini koʻrsatadi. Bu modellar faqat maqoladan foydalanishi mumkin, haqiqiqiy tekshirish mechanisini amalni qoʻllash qoʻllanmalarni olib tashlash mumkin. In this work, we take a closer look at these datasets.  Ularning hammasi kelajakdagi taʼminotlar uchun qiymatli rasmlar beradi, biz bir necha muammolarni ko'rib turamiz va bu narsalarning ko'proq haqiqiqiqiy moslamalarda umumiy emas. Ko'rsatilgan, biz maʼlumot to ʻplami sohasida tanlangan obʼektlarni maʼlumotlar sahifadagi qismlarga olib tashlash mumkin. Ko'pchilik tizimlar bir xil maqolalar darajada o'rganadi va kutilmaganda, maqolaning manbaslarini taʼminlovchi va qiymatlash maʼlumotida qoʻshish mumkin va modellar foydalanishi mumkin mumkin mumkin mumkin. Ushbu murakkab factori mavjud bo'lganda, modellar muvaffaqiyatli xabar topilmadi, sayt- yorliq tegining haqiqiqiy xabar topilmadi. Biz hamma modellarning toʻgʻri qismlariga o'rganish uchun juda katta qoʻyish (10%) ni ko'rsatdik. Ko'rib chiqarish va tajriba natijalari bilan foydalanish, biz muvaffaqiyatli xabar topilmagan vazifani qanday ishlab chiqarish uchun qo'llanmalar. Biz kelajakdagi maʼlumotlar tarkibini yaratishga murakkablik/bias tizimi sifatida sodda model kiritiladi va kelajakdagi model taʼminlovchisi toʻgʻri qoʻllanmagan saytdan va sanani ajratishdan foydalanadi.", 'vi': 'Việc phát hiện tin không đáng tin là một vấn đề nghiên cứu có tiềm năng lớn. Gần đây, nhiều báo cáo đã cho thấy kết quả hứa hẹn trên các tập tin tin trên diện rộng với các mẫu chỉ sử dụng bản thân mà không cần đến các cơ chế kiểm tra thực tế hay lấy bất kỳ bằng chứng nào hỗ trợ. Trong công việc này, chúng ta sẽ xem kỹ hơn các tập tin này. Trong khi tất cả đều cung cấp nguồn tài nguyên giá trị cho nghiên cứu tương lai, chúng tôi quan sát một số vấn đề có thể dẫn đến kết quả mà không thể tổng hợp trong hoàn cảnh thực tế hơn. Đặc biệt, chúng tôi cho thấy khả năng chọn lọc trong khi thu thập dữ liệu dẫn đến các hiện vật không được khích lệ trong bộ dữ liệu. Hơn nữa, trong khi hầu hết hệ thống tập luyện và dự đoán trên các bài báo cá nhân, việc chồng chéo các nguồn hàng trong dữ liệu huấn luyện và đánh giá có thể tạo ra một yếu tố gây xáo trộn mạnh mà các mô-đun có thể sử dụng. Trong sự hiện diện của nhân tố mâu thuẫn này, các mô hình có thể đạt được hiệu quả tốt bằng cách ghi nhớ trực tiếp bản đồ nhãn trang web thay vì thiết kế nhiệm vụ phát hiện tin không đáng tin. Chúng tôi thấy một sự giảm đáng chú ý (10=) trong độ chính xác của tất cả các mẫu được thử trong một tách sạch không có sự chồng chéo giữa tàu và nguồn kiểm tra. Sử dụng các quan sát và kết quả thử nghiệm, chúng tôi cung cấp các đề xuất thực tế về cách tạo các bộ dữ liệu đáng tin cậy hơn cho nhiệm vụ phát hiện tin không đáng tin cậy. Chúng tôi đề nghị khả năng sáng tạo tập tin tương lai gồm một mô hình đơn giản như là máy dò tìm nhược điểm và khả năng phát triển mô hình tương lai sử dụng một trang web sạch không chồng chéo và ngày chia nhau.', 'bg': 'Автоматичното откриване на ненадеждни новини е изследователски проблем с голямо потенциално въздействие. Напоследък няколко статии показаха обещаващи резултати по широкомащабни набори от данни за новини с модели, които използват само самата статия, без да прибягват до механизъм за проверка на фактите или да извличат подкрепящи доказателства. В тази работа ще разгледаме отблизо тези набори от данни. Въпреки че всички те предоставят ценни ресурси за бъдещи изследвания, ние наблюдаваме редица проблеми, които могат да доведат до резултати, които не се обобщават в по-реалистични условия. По-конкретно, показваме, че отклонението при подбора по време на събирането на данни води до нежелани артефакти в наборите от данни. Освен това, докато повечето системи тренират и предвиждат на ниво отделни статии, припокриващите се източници на статии в данните за обучение и оценка могат да осигурят силен объркващ фактор, който моделите могат да използват. При наличието на този объркващ фактор моделите могат да постигнат добра производителност чрез директно запаметяване на картографирането на етикета на сайта вместо моделиране на реалната задача за ненадеждно откриване на новини. Наблюдаваме значителен спад (10%) в точността при всички модели, тествани при чисто разделяне без припокриване влак/източник на изпитване. Използвайки наблюденията и експерименталните резултати, предлагаме практически предложения как да създадем по-надеждни набори от данни за задачата за откриване на ненадеждни новини. Предлагаме бъдещото създаване на набор от данни да включва прост модел като сонда за трудност/отклонение, а бъдещото разработване на модела да използва чисто, непопокриващо се място и разделяне на датата.', 'nl': 'Automatische onbetrouwbare nieuwsdetectie is een onderzoeksprobleem met grote potentiële impact. Onlangs hebben verschillende papers veelbelovende resultaten laten zien op grootschalige nieuwsbestanden met modellen die alleen het artikel zelf gebruiken zonder toevlucht te nemen tot een fact-checking mechanisme of enig ondersteunend bewijs. In dit werk nemen we deze datasets nader onder de loep. Hoewel ze allemaal waardevolle middelen bieden voor toekomstig onderzoek, observeren we een aantal problemen die kunnen leiden tot resultaten die niet generaliseren in realistischere omgevingen. Specifiek laten we zien dat selectiebias tijdens gegevensverzameling leidt tot ongewenste artefacten in de datasets. Hoewel de meeste systemen trainen en voorspellen op het niveau van individuele artikelen, kunnen overlappende artikelbronnen in de training- en evaluatiegegevens een sterke verwarrende factor bieden die modellen kunnen benutten. In aanwezigheid van deze verwarrende factor kunnen de modellen goede prestaties bereiken door direct de site-label mapping te onthouden in plaats van de werkelijke taak van onbetrouwbare nieuwsdetectie te modelleren. We zagen een significante daling (10%) in nauwkeurigheid voor alle modellen getest in een schone split zonder overlapping tussen trein en testbron. Aan de hand van de waarnemingen en experimentele resultaten geven we praktische suggesties om betrouwbaardere datasets te creëren voor de onbetrouwbare nieuwsdetectietaak. We stellen voor dat toekomstige datasetcreatie een eenvoudig model omvat als een moeilijkheids/bias probe en toekomstige modelontwikkeling gebruik maakt van een schone niet-overlappende site en datum splitsing.', 'da': 'Automatisk upålidelig nyhedsregistrering er et forskningsproblem med stor potentiel indvirkning. For nylig har flere papirer vist lovende resultater på storstilede nyhedsdatasyt med modeller, der kun bruger artiklen selv uden at ty til nogen fact-checkmekanisme eller hente nogen understøttende dokumentation. I dette arbejde ser vi nærmere på disse datasæt. Mens de alle giver værdifulde ressourcer til fremtidig forskning, observerer vi en række problemer, der kan føre til resultater, der ikke generaliserer sig i mere realistiske omgivelser. Specielt viser vi, at udvælgelsesforskeligheder under dataindsamling fører til uønskede artefakter i datasættene. Mens de fleste systemer træner og forudsiger på individuelle artikler, kan overlappende artikelkilder i trænings- og evalueringsdataene give en stærk forvirrende faktor, som modeller kan udnytte. I tilstedeværelse af denne forvirrende faktor, kan modellerne opnå god ydeevne ved direkte at huske site-label kortlægning i stedet for at modellere den reelle opgave med upålidelig nyhedsdetektering. Vi observerede et betydeligt fald (10%) i nøjagtigheden for alle modeller testet i en ren split uden overlapning af tog/test kilde. Ved hjælp af observationer og eksperimentelle resultater giver vi praktiske forslag til, hvordan man skaber mere pålidelige datasæt til den upålidelige nyhedsdetekteringsopgave. Vi foreslår, at fremtidig datasæt oprettelse omfatter en simpel model som en vanskeligheds-/bias probe, og fremtidig modeludvikling bruger et rent, ikke-overlappende websted og dato opdeling.', 'id': 'Deteksi berita tidak dapat dipercaya otomatis adalah masalah penelitian dengan potensi besar dampak. Baru-baru ini, beberapa kertas telah menunjukkan hasil yang berjanji pada set data berita skala besar dengan model yang hanya menggunakan artikel itu sendiri tanpa menggunakan mekanisme pemeriksaan fakta apapun atau mendapatkan bukti yang mendukung apapun. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kita melihat lebih dekat dataset ini. Sementara mereka menyediakan sumber daya yang berharga untuk penelitian masa depan, kita mengamati beberapa masalah yang mungkin menyebabkan hasil yang tidak generalisasi dalam settings yang lebih realistis. Secara spesifik, kita menunjukkan bahwa bias pemilihan selama koleksi data mengarah ke artefak tidak diinginkan dalam set data. Selain itu, sementara kebanyakan sistem melatih dan memprediksi pada tingkat artikel individu, sumber artikel yang saling bertindih dalam data pelatihan dan evaluasi dapat menyediakan faktor yang mengeluh yang kuat yang model dapat mengeksploitasi. Dalam kehadiran faktor mengecewakan ini, model dapat mencapai prestasi yang baik dengan langsung mengingat peta label situs daripada memmodelkan tugas nyata deteksi berita yang tidak dapat dipercaya. Kami memperhatikan titik signifikan (10%) dalam akurasi untuk semua model yang diuji dalam pembagian bersih tanpa sumber kereta/tes meliputi. Menggunakan pengamatan dan hasil percobaan, kami menyediakan saran praktis bagaimana untuk menciptakan dataset yang lebih dipercaya untuk tugas deteksi berita yang tidak dipercaya. Kami sarankan penciptaan set data masa depan termasuk model sederhana sebagai probe kesulitan/bias dan pembangunan model masa depan menggunakan situs yang bersih yang tidak meliputi dan pembagian tanggal.', 'ko': '자동적으로 신뢰할 수 없는 뉴스 검측은 커다란 잠재적인 영향을 미치는 연구 문제이다.최근 몇 편의 논문은 대규모 뉴스 데이터 집합에서 유망한 결과를 보여 주었다. 모델은 문장 자체만 사용하고 그 어떠한 사실 검사 메커니즘이나 지원 증거도 검색하지 않는다.이 작업에서 우리는 이 데이터 집합을 더욱 자세하게 연구할 것이다.비록 그들은 모두 미래의 연구에 귀중한 자원을 제공했지만, 우리는 몇 가지 문제를 관찰했다. 이런 문제들은 더욱 현실적인 환경에서 개괄할 수 없는 결과를 초래할 수 있다.구체적으로 말하자면 데이터 수집 과정에서 선택의 편차가 데이터가 집중적으로 나타나지 않으려는 위상을 초래할 수 있다는 것을 보여준다.그 밖에 대다수 시스템이 한 문장의 수준에서 훈련과 예측을 하지만 훈련과 평가 데이터 중의 중첩된 문장의 출처는 강력한 혼합 요소를 제공할 수 있기 때문에 모델은 이 요소를 이용할 수 있다.이런 혼합 요소가 존재하는 상황에서 이러한 모델은 사이트 라벨을 직접 기억함으로써 신뢰할 수 없는 뉴스 검측의 실제 임무를 모의하는 것이 아니라 좋은 성능을 실현할 수 있다.우리는 열차/테스트원이 중첩되지 않은 상황에서 깨끗한 분할에서 테스트된 모든 모델의 정확도가 현저히 떨어지는 것을 관찰했다(10%).관찰과 실험 결과를 통해, 우리는 신뢰할 수 없는 뉴스 검측 임무를 위해 더욱 신뢰할 수 있는 데이터 집합을 만드는 데 실용적인 조언을 제공했다.우리는 미래의 데이터 집합 창설에 간단한 모델을 포함하여 난이도/편차 탐측을 하고 미래의 모델 개발은 깨끗하고 겹치지 않는 사이트와 날짜 분할을 사용할 것을 건의합니다.', 'fa': 'شناسایی اخبار غیر قابل اعتماد خودکار یک مشکل تحقیقات با تاثیر بزرگی است. اخیرا، چند روزنامه به نتیجه\u200cهای قول\u200cدهنده در مجموعه\u200cهای اطلاعات بزرگ با مدل\u200cها نشان داده\u200cاند که تنها از مجموعه خود استفاده می\u200cکنند بدون استفاده به هیچ مکانیسم\u200cهای بررسی حقیقت یا بررسی از مدرک\u200cهای پشتیبانی. در این کار، ما به این مجموعه داده ها نزدیک تر نگاه می کنیم. در حالی که همه منابع ارزشمند برای تحقیقات آینده، ما تعدادی از مشکلات را مشاهده می\u200cکنیم که ممکن است به نتیجه\u200cهایی که در تنظیمات واقعی بیشتری متوجه نمی\u200cشوند. دقیقاً ما نشان می دهیم که تعادل انتخاب در طول جمع داده ها به عنوان معجزات غیر خواسته در مجموعه داده ها منجر می شود. علاوه بر این، در حالی که بیشتر سیستم\u200cها در سطح مقاله\u200cهای شخصی آموزش می\u200cکنند و پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکنند، منبع مقاله\u200cها در داده\u200cهای آموزش و ارزیابی می\u200cتوانند یک faktor سخت خجالت\u200cآورنده را که مدل می\u200cتواند استفاده کند، به طور کل در حضور این faktor خجالت کننده، مدل\u200cها می\u200cتوانند با یاد کردن نقشه\u200cهای نقشه\u200cهای صفحه به طور مستقیماً به جای نمونه\u200cسازی کار واقعی شناسایی خبرهای غیرقابل اعتماد برسد. ما یک کاهش بزرگی (۱۰%) را در دقیق برای تمام مدل\u200cهای آزمایش در یک قطعه پاکیزه با هیچ منبع قطار/آزمایش تغییر نقاشی مشاهده کردیم. با استفاده از نتایج آزمایش\u200cها و آزمایش، ما پیشنهاد\u200cهای عملی در مورد چگونه ساختن مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای قابل اعتماد بیشتری برای کار شناسایی اخبار غیرقابل اعتماد قرار می\u200cدهیم. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که آفرینش مجموعه داده\u200cهای آینده یک مدل ساده به عنوان یک امتحان مشکل/پیش\u200cبینی و توسعه مدل آینده از یک محل غیر قابل تغییر پاک و تقسیم تاریخ استفاده کنیم.', 'sw': 'Kugundua habari zisizo na uwezekano ni tatizo la utafiti na athari kubwa. Hivi karibuni, magazeti kadhaa yameonyesha matokeo yanayoahidi kwenye seti kubwa za habari zenye mifano inayotumia makala yenyewe bila kutumia mfumo wowote wa kuchunguza ukweli au kupata ushahidi wowote wa kuunga mkono. Katika kazi hii, tunaangalia zaidi kwenye seti hizi za data. Wakati wote wanatoa rasilimali muhimu kwa ajili ya utafiti wa baadaye, tunaona matatizo kadhaa yanayoweza kusababisha matokeo ambayo hayajajenga katika mazingira mengine halisi. Kwa ujumla, tunaonyesha kuwa upendeleo wa uchaguzi wakati wa mkusanyiko wa data unapelekea vifaa visivyo vimeundwa katika seti za taarifa. Zaidi ya hayo, wakati mifumo mingi inafunza na kutabiri kiwango cha makala binafsi, kufungua chanzo cha makala katika mafunzo na taarifa za uchunguzi zinaweza kutoa sababu yenye changamoto ambazo mifano inaweza kutumia. Kwa kuwepo kwa sababu hii inayochanganya, mifano inaweza kupata ufanisi mzuri kwa kukumbuka moja kwa moja ramani ya mtandaoni badala ya kutengeneza kazi halisi ya kutambua habari zisizoeleweka. Tuliangalia kuanguka kwa kiasi kikubwa (asilimia 10) kwa usahihi kwa mifano yote iliyojaribiwa katika pambanuko safi bila kufungua chanzo cha treni/jaribio. Kwa kutumia maoni na matokeo ya majaribio, tunatoa pendekezo halisi juu ya jinsi ya kutengeneza seti za taarifa za kuaminika kwa kazi za uchunguzi wa habari zisizoeleweka. Tunapendekeza kutengeneza taarifa za baadaye zinajumuisha mtindo rahisi kama mtihani wa vigumu/utafiti wa upendeleo na maendeleo ya mifano ya baadaye hutumia tovuti safi isiyo na upande wa siku.', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje automatske nevjerojatne vijesti je problem istraživanja s velikim potencijalnim utjecajem. Nedavno, nekoliko papira pokazalo je obećavajuće rezultate na velikoj vijesti podataka s modelima koji koriste samo članak, a da ne prihvate mehanizam provjere činjenica ili uzmu bilo kakve podrške dokaze. U ovom poslu, bolje pogledamo ove podatke. Iako svi pružaju vrijedne resurse za buduće istraživanje, posmatramo broj problema koji bi mogli dovesti do rezultata koji se ne generalizuju u realnijim nastavama. Posebno, pokazujemo da predrasude izbora tijekom prikupljanja podataka vode do neobičnih artifakta u podacima. Osim toga, dok većin a sustava vlaka i predviđaju na razini pojedinačnih članaka, preklapanje izvora članaka u podacima obuke i procjene mogu pružiti jaki konfliktni faktor koji se modeli mogu iskoristiti. U prisustvu ovog zbunjujućeg faktora, modeli mogu postići dobru učinku direktno sjećajući mapiranje oznake na mjestu umjesto modeliranja pravih zadataka neovjerljivog otkrića vijesti. Primijetili smo značajnu kap (10%) u točnosti za sve modele ispitivane u čistom dijelu bez preklapanja izvora vlaka/test a. Koristeći promatranja i eksperimentalne rezultate, pružamo praktične predloge o tome kako stvoriti pouzdanije podatke za zadatak otkrivanja nevjerojatnih vijesti. Predlažemo da buduća stvaranja kompleta podataka uključuje jednostavan model kao sonda za poteškoće/pristrasnost i budući razvoj modela koristi čisto mjesto koje ne prelapuje i podeljeno datum.', 'tr': 'Ullanmaýan täzelikleriň otomatik ça şyrymy uly mümkin täsirli barlag meselesidir. Soňky wagtlar, birnäçe kagyzyň uly ölçek maglumat setirlerini modalar bilen üýtgeden netijeleri görkezilip görkezilýär. Bu işde, biz bu veri setirlerine ýakyn bir seredip görýäris. Olar hemmämiz gelejekki araştyrmalar üçin değerli resurslar bererken, biz birnäçe sany problemalary we netijede düzeltmeýän netijede gözleýäris. Adatça, maglumat koleksiyonda saýlawyň ön bellenen sahypalary veri setirlerinde garyp edilmedigine yol açar. Hemmäçe sistemalaryň köpüsi otly we hatlaryň derejesinde düşünýän bolsa, okuwçy we çykyş berüvlerinde maksadyň çeşmeleriniň üstünden geçmesi modelleriň ulanyp biljek güýçli çalşyrak faktöri saýlap biler. Bu çalşyryç faktor bar bolsa, nusgalar bolup bilmeýän täzelikleri aňlamak yerine saýlaw etiket mapperini düzeltmek üçin gowy hereket edip biler. Biz ähli nusgalar arasynda test edilen düşük düşük (10%) diýip pikir etdik. Görnüş we experimental netijeleri ullanýarys, we wajyp bilmeýän täzelikleri aňlamak üçin has ynamly veri setirlerini nähili bejermek üçin praktik teklipler beririk. Biz gelejekki veri setirmeleri bejermek üçin basit bir nusga çykyp/kynçylyk soragy ýaly we gelejekki nusga çykarmagyny maslahat berýäris.', 'de': 'Automatische unzuverlässige Nachrichtenerkennung ist ein Forschungsproblem mit großer potenzieller Wirkung. In letzter Zeit haben mehrere Artikel vielversprechende Ergebnisse auf großen Nachrichtendatensätzen gezeigt, bei denen Modelle nur den Artikel selbst verwenden, ohne auf einen Faktenüberprüfungsmechanismus zurückzugreifen oder irgendwelche unterstützenden Beweise abzurufen. In dieser Arbeit werfen wir einen genaueren Blick auf diese Datensätze. Während sie alle wertvolle Ressourcen für zukünftige Forschung liefern, beobachten wir eine Reihe von Problemen, die zu Ergebnissen führen können, die sich in realistischeren Umgebungen nicht verallgemeinern. Insbesondere zeigen wir, dass Selektionsbias während der Datenerfassung zu unerwünschten Artefakten in den Datensätzen führt. Während die meisten Systeme auf der Ebene einzelner Artikel trainieren und vorhersagen, können überlappende Artikelquellen in den Trainings- und Evaluationsdaten einen starken Störfaktor darstellen, den Modelle ausnutzen können. In Anwesenheit dieses Störfaktors können die Modelle eine gute Leistung erzielen, indem sie die Site-Label-Mapping direkt speichern, anstatt die eigentliche Aufgabe der unzuverlässigen Nachrichtenerkennung zu modellieren. Wir beobachteten einen signifikanten Rückgang der Genauigkeit (10%) bei allen getesteten Modellen in einem sauberen Split ohne Überlappung zwischen Zug und Testquelle. Anhand der Beobachtungen und experimentellen Ergebnisse geben wir praktische Vorschläge, wie zuverlässigere Datensätze für die unzuverlässige Nachrichtenerkennung erstellt werden können. Wir schlagen vor, dass die zukünftige Datensatzerstellung ein einfaches Modell als Schwierigkeits-/Bias-Probe einschließt und zukünftige Modellentwicklungen eine saubere, nicht überlappende Site- und Datumsaufteilung verwenden.', 'af': "Outomatiese onvertroubare nuusbeskrywing is 'n ondersoek probleem met groot potensiele effek. Onlangs het verskeie papiere beloftende resultate vertoon op groot-skaal nuusdatumstels met modele wat slegs die artikel self gebruik sonder om aan enige feit-kontrole-mekanisme te herstel of enige ondersteunde bevestige te onttrek. In hierdie werk neem ons 'n nader kyk na hierdie datastelle. Alhoewel hulle almal waardelik hulpbronne voorsien vir toekomstige ondersoek, ons aanhou 'n aantal probleme wat dalk kan lei na resultate wat nie genereliseer word in meer realistiese instellings nie. Spesifieke, ons wys dat keuse bias tydens data versameling lei na onversoekte artifakte in die datastel. In addition, while most systems train and predict at the level of individual articles, overlapping article sources in the training and evaluation data can provide a strong confounding factor that models can exploit. In die teenwoordigheid van hierdie skaamtige faktor, kan die modele goeie prestasie bereik deur direk geheuning van die tuistelabel kaart in plaas van modellering van die werklike taak van onvertroubare nuusbeskrywing. Ons het 'n betekende afval (10%) aangesien in presies vir alle modele wat in 'n skoon gespreek is, met geen trein/toets bron oorvloei nie. By die gebruik van die observasies en eksperimentele resultate, verskaf ons praktiese voorstellings oor hoe om meer vertroubare datastelle te skep vir die onvertroubare nuusbeskrywing taak. Ons voorstel toekomstige datastel skepping 'n eenvoudige model as 'n moeilikheid/bias probe en toekomstige model ontwikkeling gebruik 'n rein nie-oorvloediging tuis en datum skei.", 'hy': 'Ավտոմատ անվստահելի նորությունների հայտնաբերումը մեծ պոտենցիալ ազդեցություն ունի հետազոտության խնդիր: Վերջերս մի քանի հոդվածներ ցույց են տալիս խոստացնող արդյունքներ մեծ մակարդակի նորությունների տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, որոնք միայն օգտագործում են հոդվածը առանց օգտագործելու փաստերի ստուգելու մեխանիզմ կամ որևէ աջակցնող ապացույցներ: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ավելի ուշադիր նայում ենք այս տվյալների համակարգերին: Մինչդեռ նրանք բոլորն արժեքավոր ռեսուրսներ են տրամադրում ապագա հետազոտության համար, մենք հետևում ենք մի շարք խնդիրներին, որոնք կարող են հանգեցնել արդյունքներին, որոնք ավելի իրական միջավայրում չեն ընդհանրացվում: Հատկապես, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ընտրության կողմնականությունը տվյալների հավաքածուի ժամանակ հանգեցնում է անցանկալի արտահայտությունների տվյալների համակարգերում: Ավելին, մինչ համակարգերի մեծամասնությունը սովորեցնում է և կանխագուշակում է անհատական հոդվածների մակարդակում, կապված հոդվածների աղբյուրները ուսուցման և գնահատման տվյալների մեջ կարող են առաջացնել ուժեղ խառնաշփոթ գործոն, որը Այս շփոթեցնող գործոնի առկայության դեպքում մոդելները կարող են լավ արդյունք հասնել, անմիջապես հիշելով կայքի պիտակների քարտեզագրությունը, ոչ թե նորությունների անվստահելի հայտնաբերման իրական խնդիրը: Մենք նկատեցինք, որ բոլոր մոդելների ճշգրտությունը նշանակալի նվազում է (10 տոկոս), որոնք փորձարկվել են մաքուր բաժանման մեջ, առանց գնացքի և փորձարկման աղբյուրի հակադրման: Օգտագործելով հետազոտությունները և փորձարկվող արդյունքները, մենք առաջարկում ենք, թե ինչպես ստեղծել ավելի վստահելի տվյալների համակարգեր անվստահելի նորությունների հայտնաբերման խնդրի համար: Մենք առաջարկում ենք, որ ապագա տվյալների համակարգի ստեղծումը ներառի մի պարզ մոդել, որպես դժվարություն և կողմնականություն ուսումնասիրություն, և ապագա մոդելի զարգացումը օգտագործում է մաքուր, չկողմնակող կայք', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে অবিশ্বাস্য সংবাদ আবিষ্কার হচ্ছে একটি গবেষণা সমস্যা যার সম্ভাব্য প্রভাব রয়েছে। সম্প্রতি বেশ কিছু পত্রিকা প্রতিশ্রুতি প্রদর্শন করেছে বিশাল সংবাদ তথ্য সংক্রান্ত তথ্য সংক্রান্ত ফলাফলের সাথে যারা মডেল ব্যবহার করে কেবল এই প্র এই কাজে আমরা এই তথ্য সেটের দিকে কাছাকাছি দেখি। যদিও তারা সকলেই ভবিষ্যত গবেষণার জন্য মূল্যবান সম্পদ প্রদান করে, আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি সমস্যা দেখছি যা ফলাফলের ফলে যা আরো বাস্তবিক বৈশিষ্ট্ বিশেষ করে, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে তথ্য সংগ্রহের সময় নির্বাচনের বিভাগ তথ্য সংগ্রহের কারণে অসন্তুষ্ট বস্তুর কাছে যায়। এছাড়াও, যখন বেশীরভাগ সিস্টেম ব্যক্তিগত প্রবন্ধের পর্যায়ে ট্রেন এবং ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করে, তখন প্রশিক্ষণ এবং মূল্যায়নের তথ্য পুনরায় প্রবন্ধের সূত্র প্ এই বিভ্রান্ত কারণের উপস্থিতিতে মোডেলগুলো সরাসরি সাইট-লেবেল ম্যাপিং স্মরণ করে ভালো প্রদর্শন করতে পারে অসম্ভব সংবাদ সনাক্ত করার পরিবর্তে সা আমরা একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ফ্ল্যাপ (১০%) পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষার জন্য সকল মডেল পরীক্ষা করেছি ট্রেন/পরীক্ষার সূত্রের কোন কা পরীক্ষা এবং পরীক্ষার ফলাফল ব্যবহার করে আমরা বাস্তবিক পরামর্শ দিয়েছি কিভাবে বিশ্বাস করা যায় না সংবাদ সনাক্ত করার জন্য আরো বিশ্বস্ আমরা পরামর্শ দিচ্ছি ভবিষ্যতের ডাটাসেট সৃষ্টির মধ্যে একটি সাধারণ মডেল যেমন কঠিন/বিয়াস প্রক্রিয়া এবং ভবিষ্যতের মডেল উন্নয়নের মধ', 'az': 'Avtomatik inanılmaz xəbərlər keşfetməsi böyük potensial təsiri olan araştırma problemidir. Son zamanlarda, bir neçə kağıtlar böyük ölçüdə xəbər verilənlərin verilənlərin sonuçlarını göstərdilər ki, məlumatı yalnız özünə istifadə etmədən və ya heç bir dəlili istifadə etmədən istifadə edərlər. Bu işdə, bu verilən qurularına daha yaxınlaşdırırıq. Hamısı gələcək araştırmalar üçün qiymətli resurslar təmin edərkən, biz bir neçə problemi görürük ki, daha çox reallı tərzlərdə generalizə olmayan sonuçları olar. Biz məlumatlar koleksiyonu sırasında seçmə tərzini göstəririk ki, verilən qurğularda seçmə tərzini seçməz artifaktlarına yol açar. Əksinə, sistemlərin çoxu tələb edir və tələb edirlər ki, modellərin istifadə edə biləcəyi qüvvətli karıştırıcı faktör olar. Bu qarışıqlıq faktörünün yanında, modellər yaxşı performansı olaraq sajt etiketini düzgün yada salmaq yerinə müəyyən edilməz xəbərlər keşfinin həqiqət işini modelləşdirmək üçün sajt etiketini yada salıb başa düşə bilər. Biz bütün modellər təmiz bölündə imtahana çəkilməyən, tren/test kaynağının üstünə gəlməyən təqsirli bir düşüşünü (10%) gördük. Gözləri və təcrübə sonuçlarını istifadə edirək, güvenilir olmayan xəbərlər keşfetməsi üçün daha güvenilir verilən qurğular necə yaratmağı praktik təklif edirik. Biz gələcək verilən quruluş yaratmasını təbliğ edirik ki, çətin/bias sonu və gələcək modellərin təmizlənməsi üçün asan bir modellə istifadə edir.', 'ca': "La detecció automàtica de notícies poc fiables és un problem a de recerca amb gran impacte potencial. Recently, several papers have shown promising results on large-scale news datasets with models that only use the article itself without resorting to any fact-checking mechanism or retrieving any supporting evidence.  En aquest treball, mirem més a prop aquests conjunts de dades. Mentre tots proporcionen recursos valiosos per a la recerca futura, observem alguns problemes que poden portar a resultats que no s'generalitzen en entorns més realistes. Especificament, demostram que el bias de selecció durant la col·lecció de dades porta a artefactes no desitjats en els conjunts de dades. A més, mentre la majoria dels sistemes entrenen i predeixen a nivell d'articles individuals, les fonts d'articles que es sovrapposen en les dades d'entrenament i evaluació poden proporcionar un fort factor confusor que els models poden explotar. En presença d'aquest factor confusor, els models poden aconseguir un bon rendiment memoritzant directament el mapatge de l'etiqueta del lloc en comptes de modelar la tasca real de detecció de notícies poc fiables. Vam observar una baixa significativa (10%) en la precisió de tots els models testats en una divisió neta sense cap sobreposició de fonts de tren/prova. Utilitzant les observacions i els resultats experimentals, donem suggericions pràctiques sobre com crear conjunts de dades més fiables per a la tasca de detecció de notícies poc fiable. Sugirem que la creació futura del conjunt de dades incloua un model senzill com una sonda de dificultat/bias i el desenvolupament futur del model utilitzen un lloc neta i no sovrapposible i una divisió de dates.", 'bs': 'Otkrivanje automatske nevjerojatne vijesti je problem istraživanja sa velikim potencijalnim utjecajem. Nedavno, nekoliko papira pokazalo je obećavajuće rezultate na velikoj vijesti podataka sa modelima koji koriste samo članak, a da ne prihvate bilo koji mehanizam provjere činjenica ili uzmu bilo kakve podrške dokaze. U ovom poslu, bolje pogledamo ove podatke. Iako svi pružaju vrijedne resurse za buduće istraživanje, posmatramo broj problema koji bi mogli dovesti do rezultata koji se ne generalizuju u realističnijim nastavama. Posebno, pokazujemo da predrasude izbora tijekom kolekcije podataka vodi do nepotrebnih artifakta u setima podataka. Osim toga, dok većin a sustava vlaka i predviđaju na nivou pojedinačnih članaka, preklapanje izvora članaka u podacima obuke i procjene mogu pružiti jaki konfliktantni faktor koji modeli mogu iskoristiti. U prisustvu ovog zbunjujućeg faktora, modeli mogu postići dobru izvedbu direktno sjećajući mapiranje na lokalnoj etiketi umjesto modeliranja pravih zadataka neuvjerljivog otkrivanja vijesti. Primijetili smo značajnu kap (10%) u točnosti za sve modele ispitivane u čistom dijelu bez preklapanja izvora vlaka/test a. Koristeći promatranja i eksperimentalne rezultate, pružamo praktične predloge o tome kako stvoriti pouzdanije podatke za zadatak otkrivanja nevjerojatnih vijesti. Predlažemo da buduća stvaranja kompleta podataka uključuje jednostavan model kao sonda za poteškoće/predrasude i budući razvoj modela koristi čisto neokrlapanje mjesto i podeljenje datuma.', 'cs': 'Automatická nespolehlivá detekce zpráv je výzkumným problémem s velkým potenciálním dopadem. V poslední době několik článků ukázalo slibné výsledky na rozsáhlých datových sadách zpravodajství s modely, které používají pouze samotný článek bez uchylování se k jakémukoli mechanismu kontroly faktů nebo získání jakýchkoli podpůrných důkazů. V této práci se blíže podíváme na tyto datové sady. Zatímco všechny poskytují cenné zdroje pro budoucí výzkum, pozorujeme řadu problémů, které mohou vést k výsledkům, které se v realističtějších prostředích nezobecňují. Konkrétně ukazujeme, že selekční zkreslení během sběru dat vede k nežádoucím artefaktům v datových sadách. Navíc, zatímco většina systémů trénuje a předpovídá na úrovni jednotlivých článků, překrývající se zdroje článků v údajích o školení a hodnocení mohou poskytnout silný konfluzivní faktor, který mohou modely využít. V přítomnosti tohoto změňujícího faktoru mohou modely dosáhnout dobrého výkonu přímo zapamatováním mapování webových štítků namísto modelování skutečného úkolu nespolehlivé detekce zpráv. U všech modelů testovaných v čistém rozdělení bez překrytí vlaku a zkušebního zdroje jsme pozorovali výrazný pokles přesnosti (10%) . Pomocí pozorování a experimentálních výsledků poskytujeme praktické návrhy, jak vytvořit spolehlivější datové sady pro nespolehlivou detekci zpráv. Navrhujeme, aby budoucí vytvoření datových sad zahrnovalo jednoduchý model jako sondu obtížnosti/biasu a budoucí vývoj modelu používá čisté nepřekrývající se místo a datum rozdělení.', 'et': 'Automaatne ebausaldusväärne uudiste tuvastamine on suure potentsiaalse mõjuga uurimisprobleem. Hiljuti on mitmed artiklid näidanud paljulubavaid tulemusi suuremahuliste uudiste andmekogumite kohta mudelitega, mis kasutavad artiklit ainult ilma faktide kontrollimise mehhanismi või tõendavate tõendite hankimata. Selles töös vaatame lähemalt neid andmekogumeid. Kuigi need kõik pakuvad väärtuslikke ressursse tulevaste uuringute jaoks, täheldame mitmeid probleeme, mis võivad viia tulemusteni, mis ei üldista realistlikumates tingimustes. Täpsemalt näitame, et valiku kalduvus andmekogumise ajal viib soovimatute artefaktideni andmekogumites. Kuigi enamik süsteeme koolitab ja prognoosib üksikute artiklite tasandil, võivad koolitus- ja hindamisandmete kattuvad artikliallikad pakkuda tugevat segavat tegurit, mida mudelid saavad kasutada. Selle segava teguri olemasolul võivad mudelid saavutada head jõudlust, jättes kohapealse märgise kaardistamise meelde selle asemel, et modelleerida ebausaldusväärse uudiste tuvastamise tegelikku ülesannet. Täpsuse märkimisväärset langust (10%) täheldati kõigil mudelitel, mida katsetati puhta jagunemisega ilma rongi/katseallika kattumata. Kasutades vaatlusi ja katsetulemusi, anname praktilisi ettepanekuid, kuidas luua usaldusväärsemaid andmekogumeid ebausaldusväärse uudiste tuvastamise ülesandeks. Soovitame tulevikus andmekogumi loomisel kasutada lihtsat mudelit kui raskuse/kallutuse analüüsi ning tulevikus mudelite arendamisel kasutada puhast, mitte kattuvat koha ja kuupäeva jagamist.', 'sq': 'Gjetja automatike e mosbesueshme e lajmeve është një problem kërkimi me ndikim të madh potencial. Recently, several papers have shown promising results on large-scale news datasets with models that only use the article itself without resorting to any fact-checking mechanism or retrieving any supporting evidence. Në këtë punë, ne shikojmë më afër këto të dhëna. Ndërsa ata të gjithë ofrojnë burime të vlefshme për kërkimet e ardhshme, ne vëzhgojmë një numër problemesh që mund të çojnë në rezultate që nuk gjeneralizohen në ambiente më realiste. Veçanërisht, ne tregojmë se paragjykimi i zgjedhjes gjatë mbledhjes së të dhënave çon në artefakte të padëshiruara në grupet e të dhënave. Përveç kësaj, ndërsa shumica e sistemeve trainojnë dhe parashikojnë në nivelin e artikujve individual ë, burimet e mbishtypura të artikujve në të dhënat e trainimit dhe vlerësimit mund të sigurojnë një faktor të fortë konfuzor që modelet mund të shfrytëzojnë. Në praninë e këtij faktori ngatërrestar, modelet mund të arrijnë performancë të mirë duke kujtuar drejtpërdrejt hartimin e etiketës së faqes në vend që të modelojnë detyrën reale të zbulimit të lajmeve të pabesueshëm. Kemi vëzhguar një rënie të rëndësishme (10%) në saktësi për të gjithë modelet e testuar në një ndarje të pastër pa mbishtypje të burimit treni/test. Duke përdorur vëzhgimet dhe rezultatet eksperimentale, ne japim sugjerime praktike se si të krijojmë grupe të dhënash më të besueshme për detyrën e zbulimit të lajmeve të pabesueshme. Ne sugjerojmë që krijimi i grupit të të dhënave të ardhshëm të përfshijë një model të thjeshtë si një sondë vështirësie/paragjykimi dhe zhvillimi i modelit të ardhshëm të përdorë një faqe të pastër pa mbishtypje dhe ndarje date.', 'am': 'በራሱ የማይቻል ዜና ማግኘት ትልቅ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ በቅርቢቱ ዘመን፣ ብዙ ገጾች በተለይ የዜና ዳታተሮች ላይ የተስፋ ፍሬዎችን አሳይተዋል፡፡ በዚህ ስራ እነዚህን ዳታ-ሰርሰቶች አቅራቢያ እንመለከታለን፡፡ ሁሉም ለኋለኛይቱ ትምህርት ሀብትን ሲሰጡ፣ አብዛኛዎቹ እውነተኛ ጉዳዮችን የማይጠቅሙ ፍሬዎችን እናሳየቃለን፡፡ በተለየ ጊዜ የዳታ ጉዳይ ብሔራዊ መፍጠር ከዳታ ሰብስብ ውስጥ ያልታወቀ አካባቢዎችን እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ብዙዎቹ ሲስተማርና በተለዩ ጽሑፎች ደረጃዎች ላይ በሚያስተማሩና በማመሳሰል ድረጉን ማሳየት እና ማመሳሰል ዳታዎችን በሚችል ብርቱ ጥያቄ ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ በሚያሳስል ውጤት ውስጥ፣ ሞዴሎቹ የማይቻለውን የዜና ማግኘት እውነተኛ ስራ ማዘጋጀት በመስጠት ማሳየት የሚችሉትን የድረ ገጽ ማስታወቂያውን በመስጠት ይችላል፡፡ በሞክራዊ/ፈተና ምንጭ በሌለበት ጥሩ ክፍል የተፈተነውን ዓይነቶች ሁሉ አሰራንነው፡፡ ማየት እና ፈተና ፍሬዎችን በመጠቀም፣ ለማይችል የማይታመን የዜና ማግኘት ስራ እንዴት እንዲጨመር የሚታመነውን ዳታተሮች እናስታወቃለን፡፡ የቀድሞው የዳታ ሳጥን መፍጠር ቀላል ምሳሌ እንዲያስፈልጋል እና የቀድሞው ሞዴል አካባቢ እና ንጹሕ ያልተካፈለ ስፍራና የቀን መክፈት ይጠቅማል፡፡', 'fi': 'Automaattinen epäluotettava uutisten havaitseminen on tutkimusongelma, jolla on suuri potentiaalinen vaikutus. Viime aikoina useat artikkelit ovat osoittaneet lupaavia tuloksia laajoissa uutisaineistoissa malleilla, jotka käyttävät artikkelia vain itse turvautumatta mihinkään faktatarkistusmekanismiin tai hakematta mitään tukevia todisteita. Tässä työssä tarkastelemme tarkemmin näitä aineistoja. Vaikka ne kaikki tarjoavat arvokkaita resursseja tulevaan tutkimukseen, havaitsemme useita ongelmia, jotka voivat johtaa tuloksiin, jotka eivät yleisty realistisemmissa olosuhteissa. Osoitamme erityisesti, että tiedonkeruun aikana tapahtuva valintavääristymä johtaa ei-toivottuihin artefakteihin aineistoissa. Vaikka useimmat järjestelmät harjoittelevat ja ennustavat yksittäisten artikkeleiden tasolla, päällekkäiset artikkelilähteet koulutus- ja arviointiaineistossa voivat olla vahva sekoittava tekijä, jota mallit voivat hyödyntää. Tämän hämmentävän tekijän läsnä ollessa mallit voivat saavuttaa hyvän suorituskyvyn suoraan muistamalla sivuston tunnisteen kartoituksen sen sijaan, että mallintaisivat todellisen tehtävän epäluotettavasta uutisten havaitsemisesta. Tarkkuus laski merkittävästi (10%) kaikissa malleissa, jotka testattiin puhtaalla split-menetelmällä ilman junan/testilähteen päällekkäisyyttä. Havaintojen ja kokeellisten tulosten avulla annamme käytännön ehdotuksia siitä, miten luodaan luotettavampia aineistoja epäluotettavaan uutisten havaitsemiseen. Ehdotamme tulevassa aineiston luomisessa yksinkertaista mallia vaikeus-/vinoutumismittarina ja tulevassa mallisuunnittelussa käytetään puhdasta ja päällekkäistä paikkajakoa.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé ora kepengin perusahaan kanggo kebuturan perusahaan sak ngupakan seneng apik. biasane Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné lagi luwih nyong nang dataset iki. Sing hal dhéwé bakal ngewehke pernik akeh kanggo barêng-barêng langgar, awake dhéwé bakal terus akèh kudu bakal ngubah dhéwé mengko pernik sekondiki sing ora ngerasakno ning aturan sing luwih dumadhi. Laptop" and "Desktop Nambah, sampeyan sistem sing luwih-luwih dumateng lan warni supoyo sampeyan kanggo ingkang artiklé sing tek, nggawe aturan ingkang dipolehasan karo perusahaan kanggo kuwi nggawe sistem sing bisa nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe model iso nggawe. Where\'s that? Awak dhéwé éntuk barêng-barêng nggawe Drop (10 %) nggawe barang dapat gak model neng ujian winih dhéwé. Drop-barêng kuwi wis rambarang gak none Ngawe ngubah akeh alêr-alêr lan akeh pancene pratik, kéné nggawe informasi pratike sing nyimpen nggawe dataset sing luwih akeh nggawe barang dhéwé kanggo nggawe barang dhéwé. Packages', 'he': 'גילוי חדשות אוטומטי לא אמין הוא בעיה מחקרית עם השפעה פוטנציאלית גדולה. Recently, several papers have shown promising results on large-scale news datasets with models that only use the article itself without resorting to any fact-checking mechanism or retrieving any supporting evidence.  בעבודה הזו, אנו מסתכלים מקרוב על קבוצת נתונים אלה. בעוד כולם מספקים משאבים ערובים למחקר עתיד, אנו צופים במספר בעיות שאולי יובילו לתוצאות שלא מתרחשות במסגרות יותר מציאותיות. במיוחד, אנו מראים את ההתמחות הבחירה בזמן אוסף נתונים מובילה לחפצים בלתי רצויים בקבוצות נתונים. בנוסף, בעוד רוב המערכות מתאמנות וחזויים ברמה של מאמרים בודדים, מקורות מאמרים מתקפלים בנתונים האימונים והעריכה יכולים לספק גורם מבלבל חזק שמודלים יכולים לנצל. בנוכחות גורם המבולבל הזה, הדוגמנים יכולים להשיג ביצועים טובים על ידי זיכרון ישיר את המפה של תווית האתר במקום לדוגמן את המשימה האמיתית של גילוי חדשות לא אמין. צפינו בפריצה משמעותית (10%) בדיקת לכל הדוגמנים שנבדקו בחלק נקי ללא התקפות של מקור רכבת/מבחן. Using the observations and experimental results, we provide practical suggestions on how to create more reliable datasets for the unreliable news detection task.  אנו מציעים שיוצר קבוצת נתונים עתידית כולל דוגמא פשוטה כחוקר קשה/צדדים ופיתוח דוגמא עתידי להשתמש באתר נקי לא מתקפל וחלק תאריך.', 'ha': "Kunna zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane Recently, several papers have shown promising results on large-scale news datasets with models that only use the article itself without resorting to any fact-checking mechanism or retrieving any supporting evidence.  Daga wannan aikin, sai mu dũba zuwa ga waɗannan tsaro. Wakati da dukansu ke samar da sourcen kima wa tafarkin nan gaba, sai mu gani masu tsananin masu yiwuwa masu yiwuwa ta ƙara matsalar da za'a iya ƙara ta zama masu gaskiya. Ina ƙayyade, Munã nuna cewa zaɓen wata a lokacin da ake haɗa data, yana ƙara zuwa abubuwa da ba'a sãɓa ba cikin tsarin database. Da wannan, a lokacin da mafiya yawansa na'ura masu tsari da ake yi wa Annabi a cikin daraja guda, yana rufe sourcen makala cikin shirin da kuma da data ga evaluation, za'a iya bãyar da wani fakta mai ƙarfi da misalin za'a iya amfani da shi. Idan ana halarce wannan fakta mai haɗa, misalin za'a iya sãmun babban aiki mai kyau game da tunãtarwa wajen karnin-bangon-bangon-bangon don ya sami aikin gaskiya na canza zane-zane wa zane-zane-zane-zane-zane. Ba mu gane wani ɓangare mai girma (10%) da aka ƙayyade wa duk misãlai wanda aka jarraba cikin wani rabo mai tsari, kuma ba da wani rufe source na togi/jarraba. Yi amfani da taƙailo da matsalan jarrabai, Munã ƙayyade masu amfani da jinsi za'a ƙiƙira wasu masu tsari masu amince wa aikin canza zane-zane-zane da bã za'a yi ĩmãni ba. Tunamaɗa in halitta danne-danne masu gaba, za'a haɗe wata misali mai sauƙi kamar wata masĩfa mai tsanani/matsayi da kwamfyutan misali na gaba, ko kuma za'a yi amfani da tsarin tsari mai tsari da kwanan-duffai.", 'bo': 'རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རྟོགས་མི་ཐུབ་པའི་བརྡ་ཞིག་རྟོགས་ནི་འགྱུར་བ་ཁག་ཅིག་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པའི་དཀའ་ངལ ཉེ་ཆར་བར་དུ། ཤོག་བྱང་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་གསར་འགོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་གནས་སྡུད་ཚན་འདི་ཚོ་ལ་ཉེ་བར་བལྟ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་མ་འོངས་བའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཐོན་ཁུངས་མང་པོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་ཀྱང་ང་ཚོས་དཀའ་རྐྱེན་ཡང་མཐོང་སྣང་མེད་པའི་ གསལ་བཤད་པ། ང་ཚོས་སྤྱད་ནས་གདམ་ཀ་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་ནང་དུ་བདམས་ཟིན་པའི་ལུགས་སྣང་ཚུལ་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ད་དུང་། མ་ལག་གི་ཆེ་ཆུང་དུ་མ་ལག་འཁྱེར་སྐྱོང་དང་སྔོན་ཚོད་སྒྲིག་ཚིག་རྣམ་པ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་བསྐྱེད་ཚད་ནང་གི་ཡིག འོན་ཀྱང་། འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་མཚམས་བཅད་མེད་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་མིག་སྟོན་པའི་དྲན་བསྐུལ་གྱི་ལས་འགན་སྐྱོན་ཡོད ང་ཚོས་མིག་པས་རྩོལ་བ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་གི་ཚད་འཛིན་བྱས་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་མཐོང་སྣང་དང་བརྟག ང་ཚོས་མ་འོངས', 'sk': 'Avtomatsko nezanesljivo zaznavanje novic je raziskovalni problem z velikim potencialnim učinkom. V zadnjem času je več člankov pokazalo obetavne rezultate na obsežnih zbirkah podatkov o novicah z modeli, ki uporabljajo samo članek, ne da bi se zatekli k nobenemu mehanizmu za preverjanje dejstev ali pridobili kakršne koli podporne dokaze. V tem delu si podrobneje ogledamo te nabore podatkov. Medtem ko vsi zagotavljajo dragocene vire za prihodnje raziskave, opazujemo številne težave, ki lahko vodijo do rezultatov, ki se v bolj realističnih okoljih ne posplošijo. Natančneje pokažemo, da izbirna pristranskost med zbiranjem podatkov vodi do neželenih artefaktov v naborih podatkov. Medtem ko večina sistemov usposablja in napoveduje na ravni posameznih člankov, lahko prekrivanje virov člankov v podatkih o usposabljanju in ocenjevanju zagotovi močan dejavnik zmedenosti, ki ga modeli lahko izkoristijo. V prisotnosti tega zmedenega faktorja lahko modeli dosežejo dobro učinkovitost z neposrednim zapomnjevanjem mapiranja oznake mesta namesto modeliranja resnične naloge nezanesljivega odkrivanja novic. Pri vseh modelih, testiranih v čisti razdelitvi brez prekrivanja vlaka/preskusnega vira, smo opazili znaten padec natančnosti (10%). S pomočjo opazovanj in eksperimentalnih rezultatov podamo praktične predloge za ustvarjanje zanesljivejših naborov podatkov za nalogo nezanesljivega odkrivanja novic. Predlagamo, da bodoče oblikovanje podatkovnega nabora vključuje preprost model kot sonda težavnosti/pristranskosti, prihodnji razvoj modela pa uporablja čisto neprekrivano mesto in datumsko razdelitev.'}
{'en': 'Unsupervised Extractive Summarization using Pointwise Mutual Information', 'ar': 'التلخيص الاستخراجي غير الخاضع للرقابة باستخدام المعلومات المتبادلة Pointwise', 'pt': 'Sumarização Extrativa Não Supervisionada usando Informações Mútuas Pointwise', 'fr': "Synthèse extractive non supervisée à l'aide d'informations mutuelles ponctuelles", 'es': 'Resumen extractivo no supervisado mediante Pointwise Mutual Information', 'zh': '用逐点互信息者无监督提取摘要', 'ja': 'ポイントワイズ相互情報を使用した無監督抽出の要約', 'ru': 'Неконтролируемое экстрактивное суммирование с использованием точечной взаимной информации', 'hi': 'बिंदुवार पारस्परिक जानकारी का उपयोग करके असुरक्षित निष्कर्षण सारांशीकरण', 'ga': 'Achoimre Eastóscach Gan Maoirseacht ag úsáid Pointwise Mutual Information', 'ka': 'დამუშავებელი ექსტრაქტიური რეზიმიზაცია Pointwise ერთადერთი ინფორმაციის გამოყენებით', 'el': 'Μη εποπτευόμενη αποσπαστική περίληψη χρησιμοποιώντας τις αμοιβαίες πληροφορίες', 'it': 'Riassunto estrattivo non supervisionato utilizzando le informazioni reciproche Pointwise', 'hu': 'Felügyelet nélküli extraktív összefoglalás pontos irányban kölcsönös információkkal', 'ms': 'Ringkasan Ekstraktif Tidak Dikawal menggunakan Maklumat Bersama-sama Pointwise', 'kk': 'Қосымша мәліметті көмегімен таңдалмаған ekstrahивті тұжырымдамасы', 'lt': 'Neprižiūrima ekstraktyvi santrauka naudojant tarpusavio informacijos taško atžvilgiu', 'mt': 'Sommarju Estrattiv Mhux Sorveljat bl-użu ta’ Informazzjoni Reċiproka Punentali', 'mn': 'Pointwise Mutual Information', 'no': 'Ikkje oppretta ekstraktivt samandrag ved hjelp av «Pointwise Mutual Information»', 'pl': 'Niekontrolowane podsumowanie ekstrakcyjne przy użyciu punktowych wzajemnych informacji', 'ro': 'Rezumată extractivă nesupravegheată utilizând informații reciproce Pointwise', 'sr': 'Неукрепирана екстрактивна резамирација користећи посредну информацију', 'si': 'Pointwise සම්බන්ධ තොරතුරු භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාත්මක සම්බන්ධය', 'so': 'Heeganka qofka aan la ilaalinayn', 'sv': 'Icke övervakad extraktiv sammanfattning med hjälp av Pointwise ömsesidig information', 'ml': 'പോയിന്റ്വൈസ് മ്യൂട്ടുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചു് പുറത്തുകടക്കുന്നതിനു് നിരീക്ഷിക്കാത്ത', 'mk': 'Unsupervised Extractive Summarization using Pointwise Mutual Information', 'ta': 'புள்ளிப்புள்ளி துணை தகவலை பயன்படுத்தி பார்க்கப்படாத சுருக்கம்', 'ur': 'Pointwise Mutual Information', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Chưa được giám sát Tóm tắt bằng Pointise Mutual Information', 'bg': 'Неконтролирано екстрактивно обобщаване с помощта на взаимна информация по точката', 'da': 'Ikke-overvåget ekstraktiv opsummering ved hjælp af punktvis gensidig information', 'nl': 'Extractieve samenvatting zonder toezicht met puntige wederzijdse informatie', 'hr': 'Neodređena ekstraktivna sažetka koristeći zajedničku informaciju Pointwise', 'id': 'Ringkasan Ekstraktif Tidak Disupervisi menggunakan Informasi Bersama-sama Pointwise', 'de': 'Unservised extractive summarization with Pointwise Mutual Information', 'fa': 'با استفاده از اطلاعات همگانی Pointwise', 'ko': '점적 상호 정보 기반의 무감독 추출 요약', 'sw': 'Ujumbe usiotangaliwa na Utoto kwa kutumia taarifa za Kitaarifa', 'sq': 'Unsupervised Extractive Summarization using Pointwise Mutual Information', 'tr': 'Çikgi Maglumat ullanýan Taýry Gaýd Edilmegi', 'af': 'Onondersteunde ekstraktiewe opsomming gebruik Pointwise Mutual Information', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Օգտագործելով միասին տեղեկատվություն', 'az': 'Pointwise Mutual Information vasit…Щsil…Щ istifad…Щ edilm…Щmi≈Я Extractive Summarization', 'bs': 'Neodređena ekstraktivna sažetka koristeći zajedničku informaciju Pointwise', 'bn': 'বিন্দুকভাবে মিউটুয়াল তথ্য ব্যবহার করে অপারেক্ষিত সামার্মিজেশন', 'ca': 'Unsupervised Extractive Summarization using Pointwise Mutual Information', 'et': 'Järelevalveta ekstraktiivne kokkuvõte, mis kasutab otsekäigulist vastastikust teavet', 'cs': 'Nekontrolované extrakční shrnutí pomocí bodových vzájemných informací', 'fi': 'Valvontaton ekstraktiivinen yhteenveto käyttäen pointwise keskinäistä tietoa', 'jv': 'Purge indentation and justification', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Nenadzorovano ekstraktivno povzetek z uporabo točkovno usmerjenih medsebojnih informacij', 'bo': 'Pointwise Mutual ཆ་འཕྲིན་སྤྱོད་ནས་སྲུང་མེད་པའི་འཕགས་རིས་ཐོག་མཛོད་ཁུངས', 'he': 'שימוש במידע משותף נקודי'}
{'en': 'Unsupervised approaches to extractive summarization usually rely on a notion of sentence importance defined by the semantic similarity between a sentence and the document. We propose new metrics of relevance and redundancy using pointwise mutual information (PMI) between sentences, which can be easily computed by a pre-trained language model. Intuitively, a relevant sentence allows readers to infer the document content (high PMI with the document), and a redundant sentence can be inferred from the summary (high PMI with the summary). We then develop a greedy sentence selection algorithm to maximize relevance and minimize redundancy of extracted sentences. We show that our method outperforms similarity-based methods on datasets in a range of domains including news, medical journal articles, and personal anecdotes.', 'es': 'Los enfoques no supervisados de la sumarización extractiva generalmente se basan en una noción de la importancia de la oración definida por la similitud semántica entre una oración y el documento. Proponemos nuevas métricas de relevancia y redundancia mediante el uso de información mutua puntual (PMI) entre oraciones, que se puede calcular fácilmente mediante un modelo de lenguaje previamente entrenado. Intuitivamente, una frase relevante permite a los lectores inferir el contenido del documento (PMI alto con el documento), y una oración redundante se puede inferir del resumen (PMI alto con el resumen). Luego desarrollamos un algoritmo de selección de oraciones codicioso para maximizar la relevancia y minimizar la redundancia de las oraciones extraídas. Demostramos que nuestro método supera a los métodos basados en similitudes en conjuntos de datos en una variedad de dominios que incluyen noticias, artículos de revistas médicas y anécdotas personales.', 'fr': "Les approches non supervisées de la synthèse extractive reposent généralement sur une notion d'importance de la phrase définie par la similitude sémantique entre une phrase et le document. Nous proposons de nouvelles mesures de pertinence et de redondance à l'aide d'informations mutuelles ponctuelles (PMI) entre les phrases, qui peuvent être facilement calculées par un modèle linguistique pré-formé. Intuitivement, une phrase pertinente permet au lecteur de déduire le contenu du document (PMI élevé avec le document), et une phrase redondante peut être déduite du résumé (PMI élevé avec le résumé). Nous développons ensuite un algorithme de sélection de phrases gourmand pour maximiser la pertinence et minimiser la redondance des phrases extraites. Nous montrons que notre méthode surpasse les méthodes basées sur la similarité sur des ensembles de données dans divers domaines, notamment les actualités, les articles de revues médicales et les anecdotes personnelles.", 'pt': 'Abordagens não supervisionadas para sumarização extrativa geralmente dependem de uma noção de importância da sentença definida pela semelhança semântica entre uma sentença e o documento. Propomos novas métricas de relevância e redundância usando informações mútuas pontuais (PMI) entre sentenças, que podem ser facilmente calculadas por um modelo de linguagem pré-treinado. Intuitivamente, uma frase relevante permite aos leitores inferir o conteúdo do documento (alto PMI com o documento), e uma frase redundante pode ser inferida a partir do resumo (alto PMI com o resumo). Desenvolvemos então um algoritmo guloso de seleção de sentenças para maximizar a relevância e minimizar a redundância das sentenças extraídas. Mostramos que nosso método supera os métodos baseados em similaridade em conjuntos de dados em vários domínios, incluindo notícias, artigos de revistas médicas e anedotas pessoais.', 'ar': 'تعتمد الأساليب غير الخاضعة للإشراف للتلخيص الاستخراجي عادةً على فكرة أهمية الجملة المحددة من خلال التشابه الدلالي بين الجملة والوثيقة. نقترح مقاييس جديدة للأهمية والتكرار باستخدام المعلومات المتبادلة النقطية (PMI) بين الجمل ، والتي يمكن حسابها بسهولة عن طريق نموذج لغة مدرب مسبقًا. بشكل بديهي ، تسمح الجملة ذات الصلة للقراء باستنتاج محتوى المستند (مؤشر مديري المشتريات مرتفع مع المستند) ، ويمكن استنتاج جملة زائدة عن الحاجة من الملخص (مؤشر مديري المشتريات مرتفع مع الملخص). نقوم بعد ذلك بتطوير خوارزمية اختيار الجمل الجشعة لزيادة الملاءمة وتقليل التكرار في الجمل المستخرجة. نوضح أن طريقتنا تتفوق في الأداء على الأساليب القائمة على التشابه في مجموعات البيانات في مجموعة من المجالات بما في ذلك الأخبار ومقالات المجلات الطبية والحكايات الشخصية.', 'zh': '提取性摘要无监督之法,常赖句文档之间语义相似性定义之要。 句间之逐点互信息(PMI),关性冗余之新指标,可以豫训之言。 直观曰:句许读者推文档(文档之高PMI),而从摘要中推断出余句(摘要高PMI)。 然后开一贪句择算法,以大限增相关性而减句之冗余。 吾明吾法列域之数集上优于相似性,包新闻,医学期刊文章私轶事。', 'hi': 'निष्कर्षण summarization के लिए असुरक्षित दृष्टिकोण आमतौर पर एक वाक्य और दस्तावेज़ के बीच शब्दार्थ समानता द्वारा परिभाषित वाक्य महत्व की धारणा पर निर्भर करते हैं। हम वाक्यों के बीच बिंदुवार पारस्परिक जानकारी (पीएमआई) का उपयोग करके प्रासंगिकता और अतिरेक के नए मैट्रिक्स का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिसे आसानी से पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल द्वारा गणना की जा सकती है। Intuitively, एक प्रासंगिक वाक्य पाठकों को दस्तावेज़ सामग्री (दस्तावेज़ के साथ उच्च PMI) का अनुमान लगाने की अनुमति देता है, और सारांश (सारांश के साथ उच्च पीएमआई) से एक अनावश्यक वाक्य का अनुमान लगाया जा सकता है। फिर हम प्रासंगिकता को अधिकतम करने और निकाले गए वाक्यों की अतिरेक को कम करने के लिए एक लालची वाक्य चयन एल्गोरिथ्म विकसित करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि हमारी विधि समाचार, चिकित्सा पत्रिका लेख और व्यक्तिगत उपाख्यानों सहित डोमेन की एक श्रृंखला में डेटासेट पर समानता-आधारित विधियों को मात देती है।', 'ja': '抽出要約に対する監督されていないアプローチは、通常、文と文書の間の意味的類似性によって定義される文の重要性の概念に依存します。私たちは、事前に訓練された言語モデルによって簡単に計算できる文章間の点別相互情報（ PMI ）を使用して、関連性と冗長性の新しい指標を提案します。直感的には、関連する文章は、読者が文書の内容（文書との高いPMI ）を推論することを可能にし、冗長な文章は要約（要約との高いPMI ）から推測することができる。次に、抽出された文章の関連性を最大化し、冗長性を最小限に抑えるために、強欲な文章選択アルゴリズムを開発します。当社の方法は、ニュース、医学雑誌の記事、個人的な逸話など、幅広いドメインのデータセットで類似性に基づく方法よりも優れていることを示しています。', 'ru': 'Неконтролируемые подходы к экстрактивному обобщению обычно опираются на понятие важности предложения, определяемое семантическим сходством между предложением и документом. Мы предлагаем новые метрики релевантности и избыточности с использованием точечной взаимной информации (PMI) между предложениями, которую можно легко рассчитать с помощью предварительно обученной языковой модели. Интуитивно соответствующее предложение позволяет читателям выводить содержание документа (высокий PMI с документом), а избыточное предложение может быть выведено из резюме (высокий PMI с резюме). Затем мы разрабатываем жадный алгоритм выбора предложений, чтобы максимизировать релевантность и минимизировать избыточность извлеченных предложений. Мы показываем, что наш метод превосходит методы, основанные на сходстве, на наборах данных в ряде областей, включая новости, статьи в медицинских журналах и личные анекдоты.', 'ga': 'Is iondúil go mbíonn cur chuige neamh-mhaoirsithe maidir le hachoimriú eastóscach ag brath ar nóisean de thábhacht abairte a shainítear leis an gcosúlacht shéimeantach idir abairt agus an doiciméad. Molaimid méadracht nua ábharthachta agus iomarcaíochta ag baint úsáide as faisnéis fhrithpháirteach pointewise (PMI) idir abairtí, ar féidir a ríomh go héasca trí mhúnla teanga réamhoilte. Go hintinneach, ligeann abairt ábhartha do léitheoirí ábhar an doiciméid a thuiscint (PMI ard leis an doiciméad), agus is féidir abairt iomarcach a thuiscint ón achoimre (PMI ard leis an achoimre). Forbraímid ansin algartam roghnaithe pianbhreithe sanntach chun ábharthacht a uasmhéadú agus iomarcaíocht abairtí asbhainte a íoslaghdú. Léirímid go sáraíonn ár modh modhanna cosúlachta-bhunaithe ar thacair sonraí i raon réimsí lena n-áirítear nuacht, ailt in irisí leighis, agus scéalta pearsanta.', 'hu': 'Az extraktív összefoglalás felügyeletlen megközelítése általában a mondat fontosságának fogalmára épül, amelyet a mondat és a dokumentum közötti szemantikai hasonlóság határoz meg. Új relevanciás és redundancia mutatókat javasolunk a mondatok közötti pontos kölcsönös információk (PMI) segítségével, amelyek egyszerűen kiszámíthatók egy előre képzett nyelvi modell segítségével. Intuitív módon egy releváns mondat lehetővé teszi az olvasók számára, hogy következtessenek a dokumentum tartalmáról (magas PMI a dokumentum mellett), és az összefoglalóból redundáns mondat következtethető le (magas PMI az összefoglalóval). Ezután kifejlesztünk egy mohó mondatválasztó algoritmust, hogy maximalizáljuk a relevanciát és minimalizáljuk a kivont mondatok redundanciáját. Megmutatjuk, hogy módszerünk számos területen felülmúlja a hasonlóságon alapuló módszereket az adatkészleteken, beleértve a híreket, orvosi folyóiratokat és személyes anekdotákat.', 'el': 'Οι μη εποπτευμένες προσεγγίσεις της εξαγωγικής σύνοψης βασίζονται συνήθως σε μια έννοια της σημασίας της πρότασης που ορίζεται από τη σημασιολογική ομοιότητα μεταξύ μιας πρότασης και του εγγράφου. Προτείνουμε νέες μετρήσεις σχετικότητας και πλεονασματικότητας χρησιμοποιώντας σημειακές αμοιβαίες πληροφορίες μεταξύ των προτάσεων, οι οποίες μπορούν εύκολα να υπολογιστούν από ένα προ-εκπαιδευμένο γλωσσικό μοντέλο. Διαισθητικά, μια σχετική πρόταση επιτρέπει στους αναγνώστες να συναγάγουν το περιεχόμενο του εγγράφου (υψηλό με το έγγραφο) και μια περιττή πρόταση μπορεί να συναχθεί από την περίληψη (υψηλό με την περίληψη). Στη συνέχεια αναπτύσσουμε έναν άπληστο αλγόριθμο επιλογής προτάσεων για να μεγιστοποιήσουμε τη συνάφεια και να ελαχιστοποιήσουμε την πλεονασματικότητα των εξαγόμενων προτάσεων. Δείχνουμε ότι η μέθοδος μας ξεπερνά τις μεθόδους που βασίζονται σε ομοιότητες σε σύνολα δεδομένων σε μια σειρά τομέων όπως ειδήσεις, άρθρα ιατρικών περιοδικών και προσωπικά ανέκδοτα.', 'ka': 'ექსტრაქტიური კოსუმენტის შესაძლებლობების შესაძლებლობები განსაზღვრებული სიმპანტიური სიმპანტიური განსაზღვრებით განსაზღვრებულია სიმპანტიური სიმპანტიულობით და დო ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ ახალი მეტრიკის შესაძლებლობა და გადასრულება საშუალო ინფორმაციის გამოყენება (PMI) სიტყვების შორის, რომელიც შეუძლიათ ადვილად გადასრულებული ენის მოდელზე გამოყენება. ინტევიტიურად, შესაბამისი სიტყვები უნდა კითხველებს დოკუმენტის შესახებ (დოკუმენტის მეტი PMI) და შესაბამისი სიტყვების შესახებ შეიძლება შეიძლება შეიძლება შეიძლება შეიძლება შეიძ შემდეგ ჩვენ განვითარებთ წარმოდგენის ალგორიტიმი, რომელიც შესაძლებლობად მაქსიმიკეთება და მინუსიზება გამოყენებული წარმოდგენების შესაძლებლობა. ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ჩვენი მეთოდი განსხვავებული მონაცემების მეთოდის განსხვავება მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში, რომელიც ახალი, მედიციო დურნალის მეთოდი და პირადი ანეკ', 'it': "Gli approcci non supervisionati alla sintesi estrattiva di solito si basano su una nozione di importanza della frase definita dalla somiglianza semantica tra una frase e il documento. Proponiamo nuove metriche di rilevanza e ridondanza utilizzando l'informazione reciproca puntuale (PMI) tra frasi, che possono essere facilmente calcolate da un modello linguistico pre-addestrato. Intuitivamente, una frase pertinente consente ai lettori di dedurre il contenuto del documento (PMI elevato con il documento), e una frase ridondante può essere dedotta dal sommario (PMI alto con il sommario). Sviluppiamo quindi un algoritmo di selezione delle frasi avido per massimizzare la rilevanza e ridurre al minimo la ridondanza delle frasi estratte. Mostriamo che il nostro metodo supera i metodi basati sulla somiglianza su set di dati in una serie di domini, tra cui notizie, articoli di riviste mediche e aneddoti personali.", 'lt': 'Unsupervised approaches to extractive summarization usually rely on a notion of sentence importance defined by the semantic similarity between a sentence and the document.  Siūlome naujus aktualumo ir atleidimo iš darbo rodiklius naudojant tikslinę tarpusavio informaciją tarp sakinių, kurią galima lengvai apskaičiuoti pagal iš anksto parengtą kalbos model į. Atitinkamas sakinys suteikia galimybę skaitytojams daryti išvadą apie dokumento turinį (didelis PMI kartu su dokumentu), o santraukoje galima daryti išvadą apie nereikalingą sakinį (didelis PMI kartu su santrauka). Tada parengiame greedy sentence selection algorithm, kad kuo labiau padidintume reikšmę ir kuo labiau sumažintume ištrauktų sakinių perteklių. Mes rodome, kad mūsų metodas viršija panašumo metodus duomenų rinkiniams įvairiose srityse, įskaitant naujienas, medicinos žurnalo straipsnius ir asmenines anekdotas.', 'ms': 'pendekatan tidak diawasi untuk penghasilan ekstraktif biasanya bergantung pada konsep penting kalimat yang ditakrif oleh persamaan semantik antara kalimat dan dokumen. Kami cadangkan metrik baru yang relevan dan kelebihan menggunakan maklumat saling bertujuan (PMI) antara kalimat, yang boleh dikira dengan mudah oleh model bahasa yang dilatih-dilatih. Secara intuitif, kalimat yang berkaitan membolehkan pembaca menyimpulkan kandungan dokumen (PMI tinggi dengan dokumen), dan kalimat yang berlebihan boleh disimpulkan dari ringkasan (PMI tinggi dengan ringkasan). Kemudian kita mengembangkan algoritma pemilihan kalimat serakah untuk maksimumkan relevan dan minimumkan redundansi kalimat ekstrak. Kami menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kami melampaui kaedah berdasarkan persamaan pada set data dalam julat domain termasuk berita, artikel jurnal perubatan, dan anekdot peribadi.', 'ml': 'നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത വാക്കിന്റെയും രേഖയുടെയും ഇടയിലുള്ള വാക്കുകളുടെയും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടത്തിന്റെയും ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ആ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള പരസ്പര വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന പുതിയ ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന മെട്രിക്കുകള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. ഇത് മ Intuitively, a relevant sentence allows readers to infer the document content (high PMI with the document), and a redundant sentence can be inferred from the summary (high PMI with the summary).  പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ലാഗ്യം വാക്ക് തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം വളര്\u200dത്തുകയും പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകളുടെ ക ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d ഡേറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d ഒരുപോലെയുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെന്ന്, വാര്\u200dത്ത,', 'mt': 'L-approċċi mhux sorveljati għas-sommarju estrattiv normalment jiddependu fuq kunċett ta’ importanza tas-sentenza ddefinit mis-similarità semantika bejn sentenza u d-dokument. Aħna nipproponu metriċi ġodda ta’ rilevanza u sensja bl-użu ta’ informazzjoni reċiproka pointwise (PMI) bejn sentenzi, li jistgħu jiġu kkalkulati faċilment permezz ta’ mudell lingwistiku mħarreġ minn qabel. Intwittivament, sentenza rilevanti tippermetti lill-qarrejja li jiddeterminaw il-kontenut tad-dokument (PMI għolja mad-dokument), u sentenza żejda tista’ tiġi ddeterminata mis-sommarju (PMI għolja mas-sommarju). We then develop a greedy sentence selection algorithm to maximize relevance and minimize redundancy of extracted sentences.  Aħna nuru li l-metodu tagħna jwettaq metodi bbażati fuq is-similarità fuq settijiet ta’ dejta f’firxa ta’ oqsma inklużi a ħbarijiet, artikoli ta’ ġurnal mediku, u anedotti personali.', 'kk': 'Сұлба мен құжаттың арасындағы семантикалық ұқсастықтығынан анықталмаған сұлбалардың маңыздысының түсініктеріне әдетте тұрады. Біз сөйлемелер арасындағы қашықтық мәліметтерді (PMI) көмегімен жаңа маңыздылық және қашықтық метрикалық мәліметтерді таңдаймыз. Бұл өткен тіл үлгісімен оңай есептеуге болады. Құжаттың мазмұнын (құжаттан PMI жоғары) оқу үшін мәліметті оқу мүмкіндігі мүмкіндік береді, және қайта сөз тұжырымдығынан (тұжырымдығымен PMI жоғары). Содан кейін сілтемелерді таңдау алгоритмін жасап шығару үшін маңызды және шығарылған сөйлемелердің күшін төмендету алгоритмін жасаймыз. Біз тәсіліміздің деректер қорларына ұқсас тәртіптерімізді жаңалықтар, медицина күнделіктерінің мақалалары және жеке анкедоттардың аумағында бірнеше доменге негізделген әдістері', 'no': 'Ikkje oppretta tilnærmingar til ekstraktivt sammendrag, er vanlegvis avhengig av eit notat om setningsverdi som er definert av semantiske tilnærmingar mellom eit setning og dokumentet. Vi foreslår nye metrikar for relevant og redundancy ved å bruka punktvis mellom setningar mellom uttrykk, som kan lett reknast ut av eit først trengt språk-modell. Intuitivt kan ei relevant setning tillata lesarar å gjera innhaldet i dokumentet (høg PMI med dokumentet), og ein redundant setning kan gjerast frå sammendragen (høg PMI med sammendragen). Vi utviklar så ein algoritme for utvals av greie setningar for å maksimere relevant og minimere utpakka setningar. Vi viser at metoden vårt utfører liknande metodar på datasett i mange domene, inkludert nyhetar, medisinske dagbokartikler og personlege anecdoter.', 'mk': 'Ненадгледуваните пристапи до екстрактивната резултатација обично се потпираат на концепција на важност на реченицата дефинирана од семантичната сличност помеѓу реченицата и документот. Предложуваме нови метрики на релевантност и отпуштање користејќи точни взаемни информации (ПМИ) помеѓу речениците, кои лесно може да се пресметаат со предобучен јазички модел. Интуитивно, релевантната реченица им овозможува на читателите да ја заклучат содржината на документот (висока ПМИ со документот), а претерана реченица може да се заклучи од сумирањето (висока ПМИ со сумирањето). Потоа развиваме алгоритм за избор на алгоритам за максимализирање на релевантноста и минимизирање на претераноста на извадени реченици. Ние покажуваме дека нашиот метод ги надминува методите базирани на сличност на податоци во голем број домени вклучувајќи вести, медицински весници и лични анекдоти.', 'mn': 'Эдгээр нэмэлт тодруулах арга зам нь ихэвчлэн өгүүлбэр болон баримтын хоорондын семантик тэнцүү байдлын тодорхойлолтой ойлголт дээр байдаг. Бид өгүүлбэрийн хоорондын хоорондын хамааралтай мэдээлэл (ПMI) ашиглан шинэ хамааралтай, үнэ цэнэтэй метрикийг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь өмнө сургалтын хэл загвараар амархан тооцоолж чадна. Үнэндээ, чухал өгүүлбэр уншигчид баримтыг (баримтын өндөр ПМИ) багтааж өгдөг ба дундаж өгүүлбэрийг (нийтлэл дээр ПМИ) багтааж болно. Дараа нь бид холбоотой өгүүлбэрийг сонгох алгоритм боловсруулж, хамааралтай болон хамааралтай өгүүлбэрийг багасгах болно. Бид өөрсдийн арга нь мэдээлэл, эмнэлгийн сэтгүүл сэтгүүл, хувийн анкедот гэх мэт олон хэсэгт өгөгдлийн сангуудын төстэй арга замыг илтгэдэг.', 'ro': 'Abordările nesupravegheate ale rezumatului extractiv se bazează de obicei pe o noțiune de importanță a propoziției definită de similitudinea semantică dintre o propoziție și document. Propunem noi măsurători de relevanță și redundanță folosind informații reciproce punctuale (PMI) între propoziții, care pot fi ușor calculate printr-un model lingvistic pre-instruit. Intuitiv, o propoziție relevantă permite cititorilor să deducă conținutul documentului (PMI ridicat împreună cu documentul), iar o propoziție redundantă poate fi dedusă din rezumat (PMI ridicat împreună cu rezumatul). Apoi dezvoltăm un algoritm lacom de selecție a propozițiilor pentru a maximiza relevanța și minimiza redundanța propozițiilor extrase. Arătăm că metoda noastră depășește metodele bazate pe similaritate pe seturi de date într-o serie de domenii, inclusiv știri, articole din jurnalele medicale și anecdote personale.', 'pl': 'Nienadzorowane podejścia do ekstrakcyjnej streszczenia opierają się zwykle na pojęciu znaczenia zdania określonym przez semantyczne podobieństwo między zdaniem a dokumentem. Proponujemy nowe wskaźniki istotności i redundancji wykorzystując punktwise wzajemne informacje (PMI) między zdaniami, które można łatwo obliczyć za pomocą wstępnie przeszkolonego modelu językowego. Intuicyjnie odpowiednie zdanie pozwala czytelnikom wywnioskować zawartość dokumentu (wysoki PMI z dokumentem), a z podsumowania można wywnioskować zbędne zdanie (wysoki PMI z podsumowaniem). Następnie opracowujemy algorytm chciwego wyboru zdań, aby zmaksymalizować znaczenie i zminimalizować redundancję wyodrębnionych zdań. Pokazujemy, że nasza metoda przewyższa metody oparte na podobieństwie na zbiorach danych w różnych dziedzinach, w tym w wiadomościach, artykułach czasopism medycznych i osobistych anegdotach.', 'sr': 'Neodobreni pristupi ekstraktivnoj sažeti obično se oslanjaju na pojam važnosti rečenice definisanu semantičkom sličnošću između rečenice i dokumenta. Predlažemo nove metrike relevantnosti i redundancije koristeći točno zajedničke informacije (PMI) između rečenica, koje može lako računati predobučenim jezičkim modelom. Intuitivno, relevantna rečenica omogućava čitačima da povežu sadržaj dokumenta (visoki PMI sa dokumentom), a slobodna rečenica može biti uvedena iz sažetka (visoki PMI sa sažetkom). Onda razvijemo algoritam selekcije pohlepnih rečenica da bi maksimalizirali relevantnost i smanjili smanjenost izvlačenih rečenica. Pokazujemo da naša metoda iznosi slične metode na nizu podataka, uključujući vesti, medicinske dnevnike i osobne anecdote.', 'so': 'Unsupervised approaches to extractive summarization usually rely on a notion of sentence importance defined by the semantic similarity between a sentence and the document.  Waxaannu soo jeedaynaa qaabab cusub oo la xiriira iyo hoos u dhigashada, sida loo isticmaalo macluumaad iskaashiis ah (PMI) oo u dhexeeya erayada, kaas oo si fudud looga xisaabin karo tusaale af horay loo tababaray. Xilli ahaan eray muhiim ah ayaa akhriyayaasha u fasaxaa inay dhibaateeyaan waxyaabaha wargeyska (PMI-ka sareeya oo ku qoran dukumentiga), oo waxaa lagu dhibi karaa erayo hoos u socda xagaaga (xagaaga PMI-ka sareeya). Markaas waxaynu horumarinaa algorithm doorasha qof dam ah si aan ugu badnaano xiriirka iyo hoos u dhigno xubnaha la soo saaray. Waxaynu muujinnaa in qaababkayagu uu soo saaraa qaabab siman oo ku saabsan macluumaadka meelo kala duduwan, kuwaas oo ah warqado, warqadaha caafimaadka iyo waxyaabaha shakhsiyanka ah.', 'sv': 'Icke övervakade tillvägagångssätt för extraktiv sammanfattning förlitar sig vanligtvis på en uppfattning om meningens betydelse definierad av den semantiska likheten mellan en mening och dokumentet. Vi föreslår nya mätvärden för relevans och redundans med hjälp av punktvis ömsesidig information (PMI) mellan meningar, som enkelt kan beräknas med en färdigutbildad språkmodell. Intuitivt kan en relevant mening göra det möjligt för läsarna att dra slutsatsen av dokumentinnehållet (hög PMI med dokumentet), och en redundant mening kan dras av sammanfattningen (hög PMI med sammanfattningen). Vi utvecklar sedan en girig meningsalgoritm för att maximera relevansen och minimera redundansen av extraherade meningar. Vi visar att vår metod överträffar likhetsbaserade metoder på datauppsättningar inom en rad olika domäner inklusive nyheter, medicinska tidskriftsartiklar och personliga anekdoter.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාසයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාසය සහ වාක අපි අලුත් මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් එක්ක සම්බන්ධතාවක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවක් අ ප්\u200dරවේශයෙන්, සම්බන්ධ වාක්ය කියවන්න පුළුවන් විස්තාරයක් ලියවන්න පුළුවන් විස්තාරයක් ලියවන්න (විස්තාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශය ප්\u200dරව අපි ඊට පස්සේ ග්\u200dරීඩි වචනයක් තෝරාගන්න අල්ගෝරිතම් විශේෂය වැඩි කරන්න සහ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරමාණය කරන්න සහ ප්\u200dරමාණ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විධානය සමාන්\u200dය විධානයක් ප්\u200dරවේශ කරනවා කියලා දත්ත සේට් වලින් ප්\u200dරවේශ විධානයක් ප්\u200dරවේශ කරනවා න', 'ur': 'بغیر قابل تحقیقات کے مطابق غیر قابل تحقیقات کے مطابق ایک جماعت اور دفتر کے درمیان سیمنٹی برابری کے مطابق تعریف کیا گیا ایک جماعت کی مطابق مطابق ہے. ہم نے کلمات کے درمیان نئی معاملہ اور دھوڈنسیٹ کی مطالعہ پیش آموز کی زبان مدل سے آسان شمار کر سکتے ہیں۔ بغیر منطقی، ایک ارتباط فیصلہ پڑھنے والوں کو دکھانے کے منصوبات (دکھانے کے ساتھ بلند PMI) کے ذریعہ تنگ کرنا اجازت دیتا ہے، اور ایک دھوکا فیصلہ (سرجمع کے ساتھ بلند PMI) سے تنگ کر سکتا ہے۔ اس کے بعد ہم ایک گھوٹی جماعت انتخاب الگوریٹم کو تولید کرتے ہیں کہ اضافہ ہونے کے لئے اضافہ کریں اور اضافہ شدہ جماعتوں کی کم کم کریں۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ ایک دوسرے ڈیٹسٹ پر برابری کی بنیادی طریقے کام کرتا ہے جیسے اخبار، پزشکی جرنل لکھائی، اور شخصی آنکسدوٹ میں۔', 'ta': 'கண்காணிக்கப்படாத சுருக்கத்தை வெளியேற்றுவதற்கு முன்னேறுதல் செயல்பாடு வழக்கமாக ஒரு வாக்கு மற்றும் ஆவணத்திற்கும் இடையே பாதிப் நாம் புதிய தொடர்பு மற்றும் குறைவான முறைகளை வாக்கியங்களுக்கிடையில் புள்ளிய இடைவெளி தகவல்களை பயன்படுத்தி பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், இது மு ஒரு தொடர்புடைய வாக்கு, படிப்பாளர்கள் ஆவணத்தின் உள்ளடக்கத்தை பாதிக்க அனுமதிக்கிறது (அதிக பிமிஐ ஆவணத்துடன்) மற்றும் சுருக்கத்திலிருந்து ஒரு குற பின்னர் நாம் பெரிதாக்க வாக்கியங்களை தேர்ந்தெடுப்பத் தேர்ந்தெடுப்பு அல்gorithm உருவாக்குகிறோம் மற்றும் வாக்கி நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் எங்கள் முறைமையில் தரவுத்தளத்தின் முறைகளை ஒத்த முறையில் செய்யும் செய்திகள், மருத்துவ பத்திரிகையாளர்', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Biz bir so'zlar orasidan bir o'zlarning orasidan bir o'zlari bilan bog'liq maʼlumot (PMI) yordamida yangi bog'liq metriklarni rivojlanamiz. Bu bir o'rganilgan tillar modeldan foydalanish mumkin. Ikkinchi so'zlar hujjatning tarkibini o'qishga ruxsat beradi (hujjatning yuqori PMI bilan yuqori boʻlgan) va hisobot kichik so'zlaridan kamaytirish mumkin. Keyin biz tashqi so'zlarni ko'paytirish va cheksiz qilish uchun gapir tanlash algoritni yaratishmiz. Biz shunday ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, ma'lumotlar tarkibida bir nechta xabar, tibbiy journal maqolalari va shaxsiy narsalarni bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Cách tiếp cận chưa được kiểm soát để tóm tắt trích xuất thường dựa trên một khái niệm về mức độ quan trọng án được xác định bởi sự giống nhau theo ngữ nghĩa giữa một câu và tài liệu. Chúng tôi đề nghị thay đổi âm lượng liên quan và dự phòng bằng cách thông tin hữu hình (PMI) giữa các câu, mà có thể dễ tính toán bằng một mô hình ngôn ngữ được đào tạo sẵn. Trực tiếp, một câu nói liên quan cho phép độc giả có thể kết luận nội dung tài liệu (với mức PPI cao cùng tài liệu), và từ tóm tắt có thể kết luận một câu nói thừa. Sau đó chúng tôi phát triển một thuật to án lựa chọn câu tham lam nhằm tối đa mức độ liên quan và giảm thiểu mức thải câu trích. Chúng tôi cho thấy phương pháp của chúng tôi hoàn thiện các phương pháp tương tự trên bộ dữ liệu trong một loạt lĩnh vực bao gồm tin tức, tạp chí y tế, và giai thoại cá nhân.', 'bg': 'Неконтролираните подходи за извличане на обобщаване обикновено разчитат на понятие за значение на изречението, дефинирано от семантичното сходство между изречението и документа. Предлагаме нови показатели за уместност и редуктивност, използвайки точкова взаимна информация (ПЗМ) между изреченията, която може лесно да бъде изчислена чрез предварително обучен езиков модел. Интуитивно съответното изречение позволява на читателите да извлекат съдържанието на документа (висока ЧЗ с документа), а излишно изречение може да се извлече от резюмето (висока ЧЗ с резюмето). След това разработваме алгоритъм за избор на изречения, за да увеличим релевантността и да сведем до минимум излишността на извлечените изречения. Показваме, че нашият метод превъзхожда методите, базирани на сходство, върху набори от данни в редица области, включително новини, статии в медицински списания и лични анекдоти.', 'nl': 'Niet-begeleide benaderingen van extractieve samenvatting berusten meestal op een begrip van zinsbelang dat wordt gedefinieerd door de semantische gelijkenis tussen een zin en het document. We stellen nieuwe metrics voor van relevantie en redundantie met behulp van puntwise onderlinge informatie (PMI) tussen zinnen, die gemakkelijk kunnen worden berekend door een vooraf getraind taalmodel. Intuïtief stelt een relevante zin lezers in staat om de inhoud van het document af te leiden (hoge PMI bij het document), en een overbodige zin kan worden afgeleid uit de samenvatting (hoge PMI bij de samenvatting). Vervolgens ontwikkelen we een hebberig zinsselectiealgoritme om relevantie te maximaliseren en redundantie van uitgepakte zinnen te minimaliseren. We laten zien dat onze methode beter presteert dan op overeenkomsten gebaseerde methoden op datasets in verschillende domeinen, waaronder nieuws, medische tijdschriftartikelen en persoonlijke anekdotes.', 'hr': 'Neodređeni pristupi ekstraktivnoj sažeti obično se oslanjaju na pojam važnosti rečenice definiranu semantičkom sličnošću između rečenice i dokumenta. Predlažemo nove metrike relevantnosti i redundancije koristeći točno zajedničke informacije (PMI) između rečenica, koje se lako računaju predobučenim jezičkim modelom. Intuitivno, relevantna rečenica omogućava čitačima da uvode sadržaj dokumenta (visok PMI s dokumentom) i da se slobodna rečenica može uvući iz sažetka (visok PMI s sažetkom). Onda razvijemo algoritam izbora pohlepne rečenice kako bi se maksimalizirali relevantnost i minimizirali smanjenost izvlačenih rečenica. Pokazujemo da naša metoda iznosi slične metode na nizu podataka uključujući vijesti, medicinske dnevnike i osobne anecdote.', 'de': 'Unbeaufsichtigte Ansätze zur extraktiven Zusammenfassung beruhen in der Regel auf einem Begriff der Satzneuigkeit, der durch die semantische Ähnlichkeit zwischen einem Satz und dem Dokument definiert wird. Wir schlagen neue Metriken der Relevanz und Redundanz vor, indem wir punktweise gegenseitige Information (PMI) zwischen Sätzen verwenden, die leicht durch ein vortrainiertes Sprachmodell berechnet werden können. Intuitiv ermöglicht ein relevanter Satz den Lesern, den Dokumentinhalt abzuleiten (hoher PMI mit dem Dokument), und aus der Zusammenfassung kann ein redundanter Satz abgeleitet werden (hoher PMI mit der Zusammenfassung). Anschließend entwickeln wir einen gierigen Satzauswahl-Algorithmus, um die Relevanz zu maximieren und Redundanz extrahierter Sätze zu minimieren. Wir zeigen, dass unsere Methode ähnliche Methoden auf Datensätzen in einer Reihe von Bereichen übertrifft, darunter Nachrichten, medizinische Zeitschriftenartikel und persönliche Anekdoten.', 'da': 'Ikke-overvågede tilgange til ekstraktiv opsummering baserer sig normalt på et begreb om sætningens betydning defineret af den semantiske lighed mellem en sætning og dokumentet. Vi foreslår nye målinger af relevans og redundans ved hjælp af punktvis gensidig information (PMI) mellem sætninger, som let kan beregnes ved hjælp af en forududdannet sprogmodel. Intuitivt giver en relevant sætning læserne mulighed for at udlede dokumentindholdet (høj PMI sammen med dokumentet), og en overflødig sætning kan udledes af resuméet (høj PMI sammen med resuméet). Vi udvikler derefter en grådig sætningsvælgelsesalgoritme for at maksimere relevansen og minimere redundansen af udtrukne sætninger. Vi viser, at vores metode overgår lighedsbaserede metoder på datasæt inden for en række områder, herunder nyheder, artikler i medicinske tidsskrifter og personlige anekdoter.', 'sw': 'Matokeo yasiyohusuliwa yanayohusiana na muhimu wa hukumu yanayoelezwa na usawa wa kimapenzi kati ya hukumu na nyaraka. Tunazipendekeza mbinu mpya za umuhimu na kupunguza kwa kutumia taarifa yenye ufanisi kati ya hukumu, ambayo inaweza kuchukuliwa kirahisi na modeli ya lugha iliyoendeshwa kabla. Kwa ujumla, hukumu inayohusiana inaruhusu wasomaji kuvumbua maudhui ya nyaraka (PMI ya juu kwa nyaraka), na hukumu isiyo pungua inaweza kuathiriwa kutoka kwa muhtasari wa muhtasari (PMI ya juu kwa kiangazi cha muhtasari). Kisha tunatengeneza algorithi ya uchaguzi wa hukumu yenye umasikini ili kuongeza umuhimu na kupunguza kiwango cha hukumu zilizotolewa. Tunaonyesha kwamba mbinu yetu inafanya mbinu za usawa katika seti za taarifa katika maeneo mbalimbali ikiwa ni pamoja na habari, makala za magazeti za afya, na matukio binafsi.', 'ko': '요약 추출의 무감독 방법은 일반적으로 문장과 문서 간의 의미 유사성 정의의 문장 중요성 개념에 의존한다.우리는 문장 간의 점적 상호정보(PMI)를 이용하여 새로운 관련성과 불필요한 도량을 제시했는데, 이는 미리 훈련된 언어 모델을 통해 쉽게 계산할 수 있다.직관적으로 말하면 관련 문장은 독자로 하여금 문서 내용(문서의 PMI가 비교적 높음)을 추정하게 할 수 있고, 여분의 문장은 요약에서 추정할 수 있다(요약의 PMI가 비교적 높음).그리고 우리는 관련성을 최대한 높이고 불필요한 추출 문장을 최소화하기 위해 탐욕스러운 문장 선택 알고리즘을 개발했다.우리는 뉴스, 의학 간행물, 개인 일화 등 분야에서 데이터 집합을 바탕으로 하는 유사성 방법보다 우리의 방법이 낫다는 것을 증명했다.', 'fa': 'نزدیک\u200cهای غیرقابل تحقیق به جمع\u200cآوری خارجی معمولاً بر روی یک نظر مهم جمله\u200cای که توسط شبیه\u200cسازی semantic بین یک جمله و سند تعریف شده است، معتقد می\u200cشود. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم متریک جدید مربوط به مربوط به مربوط به وسیله اطلاعات مشترک (PMI) بین جمله\u200cها، که می\u200cتواند به آسانی توسط یک مدل زبان پیش آموزش داده شود. یک جمله مربوط به خوانندگان اجازه می\u200cدهد محتوای سند (PMI بالا با سند) را تزریق کنند، و یک جمله متفاوت از جمله (PMI بالا با جمله) می\u200cتواند تزریق شود. سپس ما یک الگوریتم انتخاب جمله\u200cای آرام را توسعه می\u200cکنیم تا اضافه\u200cای را بیشتر کنیم و جمله\u200cهای اخراج را کمتر کنیم. ما نشان می\u200cدهیم که روش ما روش\u200cهای شبیه\u200cای بر روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها در مجموعه\u200cای از دامنه\u200cها، شامل اخبار، مجموعه\u200cهای روزنامه\u200cهای پزشکی و آنکسدوت\u200cهای شخصی انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'tr': 'Taryh etmek üçin arkalanmaýan golaýarlar adatça semantik sözlem we sened arasynda tanyşdyrylýan sözlem wajyplygyna ynanýar. Biz sözler arasynda täze möhüm we çykyş metriklerini (PMI) uly bir şekilde öňünden öňünden bilim sistemasyna görä a ňsatjag hasaplanýar. Arasyz bolsa, wajyp sözlem okuwçylara sened mazmunlaryny tespit edip bilýär (sened bilen PMI uzyn), we azajyp sözlem suminden (sumrak bilen PMI uzyn) süýtgedip biler. Sonra a çylyk sözlerini azaltmak üçin açylyk saýlamak algoritmi düzenlediriz. Biz öz yöntemimiz, täzeliklerimiz, tıbbi günlük makalarymyz we şahsy anekdotelerimiz daşary çykyp bardygyny görkeýäris.', 'af': "Onondersoekte toegang tot ekstraktiewe opsomming gewoonlik op 'n nota van sin belangrikheid gedefinieer deur die semantiese gelykenis tussen 'n seting en die dokument. Ons voorstel nuwe metries van relevante en roondateit met die gebruik van puntswys gemeenskaplike inligting (PMI) tussen setings, wat maklik kan wees bereken deur 'n voorafoerende taal model. Intuitief, 'n relevante seting laat lesers toe om die dokumentinhoud (hoë PMI met die dokument) te infeer, en 'n herdulende seting kan van die opsomming afgelees word (hoë PMI met die opsomming). Ons ontwikkel dan 'n groet setseleksie algoritme om relevante te maksimeer en die redundansie van uitgevoerde setinge te minimeer. Ons wys dat ons metode uitvoer gelykenis-gebaseerde metodes op datastelle in 'n reek domeine insluitend nuus, mediese joernaal artikels en persoonlike anecdotes.", 'hy': 'Արտադրողական համառոտագրման առանց վերահսկման մոտեցումները սովորաբար հիմնված են նախադասության կարևորության գաղափարի վրա, որը սահմանվում է նախադասության և փաստաթղթի միջև սեմանտիկ նմանությունից: Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր նշաններ, որոնք կարևոր են և անհրաժեշտ են օգտագործելով իմաստային փոխադարձ տեղեկատվություն (ՄՄԻ) նախադասությունների միջև, որը հեշտությամբ հաշվարկվում է նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելի միջոցով Ինտուիտիվ, համապատասխան նախադասությունը թույլ է տալիս ընթերցողներին եզրակացնել փաստաթղթի պարունակությունը (փաստաթղթի հետ բարձր ՄԻԱ-ն), իսկ ավելին նախադասությունը կարող է եզրակացնել համառոտագրությունից (բարձր ՄԻԱ Այնուհետև մենք զարգանում ենք գաղտնի նախադասությունների ընտրության ալգորիթմ, որպեսզի մեծացնենք կարևորությունը և նվազեցնենք վերացած նախադասությունների չափազանցությունը: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը արտադրում է նմանությունների հիմնված մեթոդներ տարբեր ոլորտներում, ներառյալ նորությունները, բժշկական ամսագրերը և անձնական անկեդոտները:', 'id': 'Pendekatan tidak diawasi untuk ekstraktif ringkasan biasanya bergantung pada konsep penting kalimat yang didefinisikan oleh persamaan semantis antara kalimat dan dokumen. Kami mengusulkan metrik baru relevansi dan redundansi menggunakan informasi saling bergaul (PMI) pada titik antara kalimat, yang dapat mudah dihitung oleh model bahasa yang terlatih sebelumnya. Secara intuitif, kalimat yang relevan memungkinkan pembaca untuk menyimpulkan isi dokumen (PMI tinggi dengan dokumen), dan kalimat yang berlebihan dapat disimpulkan dari ringkasan (PMI tinggi dengan ringkasan). Kemudian kita mengembangkan algoritma seleksi kalimat serakah untuk memaksimalkan relevansi dan mengurangi redundansi kalimat ekstrak. Kami menunjukkan bahwa metode kami melampaui metode berdasarkan persamaan pada set data dalam berbagai daerah termasuk berita, artikel jurnal medis, dan anekdot pribadi.', 'sq': 'Unsupervised approaches to extractive summarization usually rely on a notion of sentence importance defined by the semantic similarity between a sentence and the document.  We propose new metrics of relevance and redundancy using pointwise mutual information (PMI) between sentences, which can be easily computed by a pre-trained language model.  Në mënyrë intuitive, një fjalim i rëndësishëm lejon lexuesit të përfshijnë përmbajtjen e dokumentit (PMI e lartë me dokumentin) dhe një fjalim të tepruar mund të përfshihet nga përmbledhja (PMI e lartë me përmbledhjen). Pastaj zhvillojmë një algoritëm të zgjedhjes së fjalëve lakmueshme për të maksimalizuar rëndësinë dhe minimizuar redundancën e fjalëve të nxjerra. Ne tregojmë se metoda jonë ekziston më shumë se metodat e bazuara në ngjashmëri në grupet e të dhënave në një sferë të ndryshme duke përfshirë lajmet, artikujt e gazetave mjekësore dhe anekdotat personale.', 'az': 'Ekstraktiv qeyd edilməsi üçün müəyyən edilməmiş yaxınlıqlar genellikle sözlərin və dökümənin arasındakı semantik similarlığı ilə tanıdığı cümlənin möhümlülülüyünün nəzəriyyətinə təvəkkül edir. Biz sözlər arasındakı məlumatlar arasında yeni məlumatları və dəyişiklik metrikləri təklif edirik. Bu, əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş dil modeli ilə asanlıqla hesablanır. Yaxşı bir cümə oxuyanlara belə məlumatı (dökümə yüksək PMI ilə yüksək PMI ilə daxil etməyə imkan verir) və qeyri-çətin cümləyi qeyri-çətinlikdən daxil edilə bilər (qeyri-çətinliklə yüksək PMI ilə daxil edilə bilər). Sonra çoxluğunu artırmaq və çəkilmək cümlələrin çoxluğunu azaltmaq üçün arxayınlı cümlələr seçilməsi algoritmi təhsil edirik. Biz göstəririk ki, metodumuzun, xəbərlər, tıbbi günlük məsələlər və kişisel anekdotelər içərisində bənzər məsələlər tərəfindən istifadə edilən məsələlər istifadə edir.', 'am': 'በተጠበቀው አቅራቢያ በክፍል እና በሰነዱ መካከል በሚያስተካክለው የቁጥጥር ግንኙነት በሚያሳየው የቁጥጥር ግንኙነት ታመነዋል፡፡ አዲስ የግንኙነት እና አዲስ የግንኙነት ማተሚያ እና በቁጥጥር መካከል የውይይት መረጃ (PMI) በመጠቀም እናዘጋጅታለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም የሥርዓት ግንኙነት ሰነዱን አካባቢዎች (ከፍተኛ PMI በሰነዱ ላይ) እንዲያስጨንቁበት ይፈቅዳል፡፡ ከዚያም በኋላ የውርስ መምረጥ መምረጫ አጎርጂምን እናሳድጋለን፡፡ እናሳያቸዋለን የሥርዓታችን ሥርዓት፣ የጥምቀት ጋዜና እና የግል አካላት እና የራሳቸውን የዳታ መስኮቶች በተለዩ አካባቢዎች ላይ የሚደረገውን እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'ca': "Els enfocaments no supervisats a la resumizació extractiva normalment es basan en una noció d'importància de frases definida per la similitud semàntica entre una frase i el document. Proposem noves mètriques de relevància i redundancia utilitzant informació mutua puntual (IMP) entre frases, que es pot calcular fàcilment per un model de llenguatge pré-entrenat. Intuïtivament, una frase rellevant permet als lectors deduir el contingut del document (IMP alta amb el document), i una frase redundant es pot deduir del resum (IMP alta amb el resum). Després desenvolupem un algoritme de selecció de frases codiciosos per maximitzar la pertinencia i minimitzar la redundancia de frases extraites. Mostrem que el nostre mètode supera els mètodes basats en la similitud en conjunts de dades en una gama de dominis, incloent notícies, articles de diari mèdic i anecdotes personals.", 'bs': 'Neodređeni pristupi ekstraktivnoj sažeti obično se oslanjaju na pojam važnosti rečenice definiranu semantičkom sličnošću između rečenice i dokumenta. Predlažemo nove metrike relevantnosti i redundancije koristeći točno zajedničke informacije (PMI) između rečenica, koje se lako računaju predobučenim jezičkim modelom. Intuitivno, relevantna rečenica omogućava čitateljima da povežu sadržaj dokumenta (visok PMI sa dokumentom), a slobodna rečenica može biti dovedena iz sažetka (visok PMI sa sažetkom). Onda razvijemo algoritam selekcije pohlepnih rečenica kako bi maksimalizirali relevantnost i minimizirali smanjenje izvlačenih rečenica. Pokazujemo da naša metoda iznosi slične metode na nizu podataka uključujući vijesti, medicinske dnevnike i osobne anecdote.', 'cs': 'Nekontrolované přístupy k extraktivní shrnutí obvykle spoléhají na pojem významu věty definovaný sémantickou podobností mezi větou a dokumentem. Navrhujeme nové metriky relevance a redundance pomocí bodové vzájemné informace (PMI) mezi větami, které lze snadno vypočítat pomocí předškoleného jazykového modelu. Příslušná věta intuitivně umožňuje čtenářům odvodit obsah dokumentu (vysoký PMI s dokumentem) a ze shrnutí lze odvodit nadbytečnou větu (vysoký PMI se shrnutím). Následně vyvineme algoritmus pro výběr chamtivých vět, který maximalizuje relevanci a minimalizuje redundanci extrahovaných vět. Ukazujeme, že naše metoda překonává metody založené na podobnosti na datových sadách v řadě oblastí, včetně zpráv, článků lékařských časopisů a osobních anekdot.', 'bn': 'সাধারণত একটি বাক্য এবং ডকুমেন্টের মধ্যে সেম্পেন্টিক সমতার দ্বারা নির্ধারিত একটি বাক্যের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ধারণার উপর নির্ভর করে অন আমরা নতুন প্রযুক্তির মাধ্যমে প্রস্তাব করি বিশেষ বিভিন্ন সাধারণ তথ্য (পিএমআই) ব্যবহার করে, যা পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেল দ্বারা সহজে  যার ফলে একটি প্রসঙ্গ বাক্য পাঠকদের এই নথির বিষয়বস্তুকে আক্রান্ত করার অনুমতি দেয় (ডকুমেন্টের সাথে উচ্চ পিএমআই) এবং সার্গারের সাথে একটি কম বাক্য তারপর আমরা একটি লোভী বাক্য নির্বাচনের অ্যালগরিদম তৈরি করি যাতে বের করে যাওয়া শাস্তি নির্ধারিত ক্ষমতা বৃদ্ধি করে এবং বের করে  আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি একই ভিত্তিক তথ্যের মাধ্যমে সংবাদ, চিকিৎসার সাংবাদিক প্রবন্ধ এবং ব্যক্তিগত ব্যক্তিগত সংবাদ প্রদান কর', 'et': 'Järelevalveta lähenemisviisid ekstraktivsele kokkuvõtmisele tuginevad tavaliselt lause tähtsuse mõistele, mida määratleb lause ja dokumendi semantiline sarnasus. Pakume välja uusi asjakohasuse ja redundantsuse mõõdikuid, kasutades lausete vahelist punktiühist informatsiooni (PMI), mida saab hõlpsasti arvutada eelõpetatud keelemudeli abil. Intuitiivselt võimaldab asjakohane lause lugejatel dokumendi sisu järeldada (dokumendi kõrge PMI) ja kokkuvõttest võib järeldada liigse lause (kokkuvõttega kõrge PMI). Seejärel töötame välja ahne lausevaliku algoritmi, et maksimeerida olulisust ja minimeerida ekstraheeritud lausete liigsust. Näitame, et meie meetod ületab sarnasusel põhinevaid meetodeid andmekogumites erinevates valdkondades, sealhulgas uudistes, meditsiiniajakirjade artiklites ja isiklikes anekdootides.', 'fi': 'Tarkkailemattomat lähestymistavat ekstraktiiviseen yhteenvetoon perustuvat yleensä lauseen merkityksen käsitteeseen, joka määritellään lauseen ja asiakirjan semanttisen samankaltaisuuden perusteella. Ehdotamme uusia merkityksellisyyden ja redundanssin mittareita käyttämällä lauseiden välistä pisteviisasta keskinäistä tietoa (PMI), joka voidaan helposti laskea ennalta koulutetun kielimallin avulla. Intuitiivisesti relevantti lause antaa lukijoille mahdollisuuden päätellä asiakirjan sisällön (korkea PMI asiakirjan kanssa), ja ylimääräinen lause voidaan päätellä tiivistelmästä (korkea PMI tiivistelmän kanssa). Kehitämme ahneen lausevalintaalgoritmin maksimoimaan relevanssin ja minimoimaan uutettujen lauseiden redundanssin. Osoitamme, että menetelmämme suoriutuu samankaltaisuuteen perustuvista menetelmistä useilla eri aloilla, kuten uutisissa, lääketieteellisissä aikakauslehtiartikkeleissa ja henkilökohtaisissa anekdooteissa.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggawe gerarané karo resumen sing wis rak dadi, digawe go ngerasai pertualangan Awak dhéwé ngerasah sistem anyar nggawe barang nggawe lan kabèh dumadhi, gambar informasi nggawe barang nggawe (PMO) terus kesempatan kanggo Kemerdekaan kesempatan, iki dadi wis dianggo kelangan ning model sing arep awak dhéwé. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé nggawe kelas kuwi kaluluh-kaluluh Awak dhéwé ngerasakno karo hal-hal sing dadi akeh gambaran karo dataset ning dadi sak dadi, nganggo barang dhéwé, artik dhéwé karo nganggo cara-anacdotes sing mengko.', 'ha': "QRegExp Tuna goyyar da wasu metrici na masu hushi da kuma da ƙaranci, ko kuma muna yi amfani da shaidar mutane masu yiwuwa a tsakanin maganar (PSI), wanda za'a iya lissafa shi da sauƙi na da wani misalin harshe wanda aka yi wa zaman wa lõkaci. Ga a lokacin, wata kalma na da amfani, ya yarda karatun karatun karatun takardan (high Prime da takardar aiki), kuma za'a iya ƙaranci wata kalma daga ƙarshen ƙara (na yi amfani da ƙara). Sa'an nan kuma muna ƙãga zaɓen algoritm mai kwaɗayi wa maximi masu hushi da kuma ƙaranci da cire masu cire. Tuna nũna cewa hanyoyinmu yana samar da shiryoyin da ke daidaita a kan danne-danne cikin wasu garwaya, kamar da zane mutane da waraka, da takardar jarurni da kuma mistakardan mutane.", 'sk': 'Nenadzorovani pristopi k ekstraktivnemu povzetku običajno temeljijo na pojmu pomembnosti stavka, ki ga opredeljuje semantična podobnost med stavkom in dokumentom. Predlagamo nove meritve relevantnosti in redundance z uporabo točkovnih medsebojnih informacij (PMI) med stavki, ki jih je mogoče enostavno izračunati s predhodno usposobljenim jezikovnim modelom. Intuitivno ustrezen stavek bralcem omogoča, da sklepajo vsebino dokumenta (visok PMI z dokumentom), odvečen stavek pa lahko sklepamo iz povzetka (visok PMI s povzetkom). Nato razvijamo pohlepen algoritem za izbiro stavkov, da bi povečali relevantnost in zmanjšali redundanco izvlečenih stavkov. Pokazali smo, da naša metoda presega metode, ki temeljijo na podobnostih, na naborih podatkov na različnih področjih, vključno z novicami, članki medicinskih revij in osebnimi anekdotami.', 'he': 'הגישות ללא השגחה לסיוריזציה חיצונית בדרך כלל תלויות על רעיון של חשיבות משפט מוגדר על ידי הדמיון הסמנטי בין משפט למסמך. אנו מציעים מטריות חדשות של רלוונטיות ותמידה באמצעות מידע משותף נקודי (PMI) בין משפטים, שאפשר לחשב בקלות על ידי מודל שפה מאומן מראש. באופן אינטואיטיבי, משפט רלוונטי מאפשר לקוראים להוציא את תוכן המסמך (PMI גבוה עם המסמך), והמשפט מוגזם יכול להוציא מהסכם (PMI גבוה עם הסכם). ואז אנחנו מפתחים אלגוריתם לבחורת משפטים חמדנים כדי למקסימום רלוונטיות ולהפחיד את מיותר משפטים. אנו מראים שהשיטה שלנו עוברת שיטות מבוססות על דמיונים במערכת נתונים בטווח של תחומות כולל חדשות, מאמרי יומן רפואי, ואנקדוטים אישיים.', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་བཅུད་སྡུད་རྩིས་ཐོག་ཏུ་རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཡིན་པའི་ཚིག་རྟགས་ཚོར་བ་དང་ཡིག་གེའི་ནང་དུ་གཏ ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་བསླབ་པའི་ཆེ་མཐོང་ཚད་དང་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་བར་གནད་ཅིག དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་ཚིག་ཡིག་ཆ་ཀློག་པ་ཚོར་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དོན་འདུག དེ་ནས་འུ་ཚོས་བློ་གཏད་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་གདམ་པའི་ཚིག་རྟགས་སྒྲིག་གི་ཆེ་ཆུང་དུ་འཕགས་རིས་མང་ཤོས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར'}
{'en': 'Deep Subjecthood : Higher-Order Grammatical Features in Multilingual BERT', 'es': 'Subjecthood profundo: características gramaticales de orden superior en BERT multilingüe', 'ar': 'الموضوعية العميقة: ميزات نحوية عالية المستوى في BERT متعدد اللغات', 'ja': '深い主題：多言語BERTにおける高次の文法的特徴', 'fr': "Deep Subjecthood\xa0: Caractéristiques grammaticales d'ordre supérieur dans le BERT multilingue", 'pt': 'Subjetividade profunda: recursos gramaticais de ordem superior no BERT multilíngue', 'hi': 'डीप सब्जेक्टहुड: बहुभाषी BERT में उच्च-क्रम व्याकरणिक विशेषताएं', 'ru': 'Глубокая предметность: грамматические особенности более высокого порядка в многоязычном BERT', 'zh': '深层主体性:多言BERT中高阶语法特征', 'ga': 'Suibiacht dhomhain: Gnéithe Gramadaí Ard-Ord i BERT Ilteangach', 'ka': 'მნიშვნელოვანი ბერტიკის გრამატიკური განსაზღვრება', 'el': 'Βαθύ Θέμα: Υψηλότερης Τάξης Γραμματικά Χαρακτηριστικά σε Πολυγλωσσικό BERT', 'hu': 'Mély tárgyak: magasabb rendű nyelvtani jellemzők a többnyelvű BERT-ben', 'it': 'Disciplina profonda: caratteristiche grammaticali di ordine superiore in BERT multilingue', 'mk': 'Длабока субјектност: Граматски карактеристики од високи редови во повеќејазични BERT', 'kk': 'Түндік тақырыбы: Көптілік BERT тілдегі граматикалық қасиеттері жоғары реті', 'lt': 'Gilus dalykas: aukštesnio rango Gramatinės savybės daugiakalbėje BERT', 'ms': 'Subjek Dalam: Ciri-ciri Grammatik Tertinggi dalam BERT Berbahasa', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തിലുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d: കൂടുതല്\u200d ക്രമീകരണ ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d വിശേഷങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Suġġett Profond: Karatteristiċi Grammatiċi ta’ Ordni Għolja f’BERT Multilingwi', 'mn': 'Гүн гүнзгий сэдэв: Олон хэлний БЕРТ-д өндөр дарааллын грамматикийн боломжууд', 'pl': 'Głęboki temat: Wyższego rzędu cechy gramatyczne w wielojęzycznym BERT', 'ro': 'Subiecte profunde: caracteristici gramaticale de ordin superior în BERT multilingv', 'no': 'Deep Subjecthood: Høgare rekkefølgje grafiske funksjonar i fleirspråk BERT', 'sr': 'Duboka temelja: Gramatične karakteristike visokog reda u multijezičkom BERT-u', 'so': 'Waxyaabaha hoose: Higher Order Grammatical Features in luqado badan BERT', 'sv': 'Djupt ämne: Högre ordningsfunktioner i flerspråkig BERT', 'si': 'ගොඩක් විශේෂය: විශේෂ ක්\u200dරමාත්මක විශේෂතාවක් ගොඩක් භාෂාවක BERT වල', 'ta': 'ஆழம் பொருள்: பல மொழி பெர்டில் உயர்ந்த- வரிசை சிக்கல் செயல்பாடுகள்', 'ur': 'عمیق سرگوشی: بہت سی زبان BERT میں بہت زیادہ آرام گراماتیکی فرصت', 'uz': 'Pastki obĘĽekt:', 'vi': 'Đầu đề sâu: Đặc trưng nhạc kịch theo thứ tự đa ngôn ngữ.', 'bg': 'Дълбока тематика: Граматически характеристики от по-висок ред в многоезичния BERT', 'hr': 'Duboka temelja: Gramatične karakteristike visokorednog reda u multijezičkim BERT-ima', 'nl': 'Diep Subject: Hoger-order grammaticale kenmerken in meertalig BERT', 'da': 'Dybt emne: Grammatiske funktioner i højere rækkefølge i flersproget BERT', 'de': 'Deep Subjecthood: Grammatische Merkmale höherer Ordnung im mehrsprachigen BERT', 'sw': 'Tamko la chini: Tamko za Ujumbe wa Higher-Order katika lugha nyingi BERT', 'id': 'Subjek Dalam: Karakteristik Grammatik Tertinggi dalam BERT Berbahasa', 'ko': '심층 주어: 다국어 동사의 고급 문법 특징', 'fa': 'موضوع عمیق: ویژه\u200cهای گراماتیک بالاتر در BERT متعدد زبان', 'tr': "Derje Mazmunlar: Yüksek-Sıradan Grammatik Özellikleri Multilingual BERT'da", 'af': 'Deep onderwerp: Hoër- volgorde Gramatiese Funksies in Multilingual BERT', 'sq': 'Subjekti i thellë: Karakteristika Gramatike me rend më të lartë në BERT shumëgjuhës', 'am': 'ጉዳዩ፦', 'hy': 'Խնդրություն: Բազլեզու BER', 'bs': 'Duboko temelje: Gramatične karakteristike visokorednog reda u multijezičkom BERT-u', 'cs': 'Hluboké předměty: Gramatické prvky vyššího řádu ve vícejazyčném BERT', 'az': '쿮n b칬y칲k m톛s톛l: 칂oxlu dilli BERT-d톛 y칲ks톛k-s캼ral캼q Gramatik 칐zellikl톛ri', 'et': 'Sügav teema: kõrgema järjekorra grammatilised omadused mitmekeelses BERT-is', 'ca': "Subjecte profund: Característiques gramàtiques d'ordre superior en BERT multilingüe", 'fi': 'Syvä aihe: Korkeamman järjestyksen kieliopilliset ominaisuudet monikielisessä BERT:ssä', 'bn': 'গভীর বিষয়: বহুভাষায় বিরুদ্ধে সর্বোচ্চ ক্ষেত্রের গ্রামাটিক্যাল বৈশিষ্ট্য', 'he': 'נושא עמוק: תכונות גראמטיות של סדר גבוה ביותר ב- BERT', 'jv': 'mboxImp', 'sk': 'Globoko predmet: slovnične značilnosti višjega reda v večjezičnem BERT', 'ha': 'ﺋ»aramiSize', 'bo': 'གནད་དོན་འདུག་སའི་ནང་གི་མཐོ་རིམ། མཐོ་རིམ་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་(Higher-Order Grammatical Features in Multilingual BERT)ནང་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'We investigate how Multilingual BERT (mBERT) encodes grammar by examining how the high-order grammatical feature of morphosyntactic alignment (how different languages define what counts as a subject) is manifested across the embedding spaces of different languages. To understand if and how morphosyntactic alignment affects contextual embedding spaces, we train classifiers to recover the subjecthood of mBERT embeddings in transitive sentences (which do not contain overt information about morphosyntactic alignment) and then evaluate them zero-shot on intransitive sentences (where subjecthood classification depends on alignment), within and across languages. We find that the resulting classifier distributions reflect the morphosyntactic alignment of their training languages. Our results demonstrate that mBERT representations are influenced by high-level grammatical features that are not manifested in any one input sentence, and that this is robust across languages. Further examining the characteristics that our classifiers rely on, we find that features such as passive voice, animacy and case strongly correlate with classification decisions, suggesting that mBERT does not encode subjecthood purely syntactically, but that subjecthood embedding is continuous and dependent on semantic and discourse factors, as is proposed in much of the functional linguistics literature. Together, these results provide insight into how grammatical features manifest in contextual embedding spaces, at a level of abstraction not covered by previous work.', 'ar': 'نحن نحقق في كيفية ترميز Multilingual BERT (mBERT) للقواعد من خلال فحص كيفية إظهار السمة النحوية عالية الترتيب للمحاذاة الصرفية (كيف تحدد اللغات المختلفة ما يمكن اعتباره "موضوعًا") عبر مساحات التضمين الخاصة باللغات المختلفة. لفهم ما إذا كانت المحاذاة الشكلية النحوية تؤثر على مسافات التضمين السياقية وكيفية تأثيرها ، فإننا ندرب المصنفات لاستعادة موضوعية تضمين mBERT في جمل متعدية (والتي لا تحتوي على معلومات صريحة حول المحاذاة الشكلية النحوية) ثم تقييمها بدون طلقة على جمل غير متعدية (حيث تصنيف الموضوعية يعتمد على المحاذاة) ، داخل وعبر اللغات. نجد أن توزيعات المصنف الناتجة تعكس المحاذاة الشكلية للغات التدريب الخاصة بهم. توضح نتائجنا أن تمثيلات mBERT تتأثر بالميزات النحوية عالية المستوى التي لا تظهر في أي جملة إدخال واحدة ، وأن هذا قوي عبر اللغات. عند فحص الخصائص التي تعتمد عليها المصنفات لدينا ، نجد أن ميزات مثل الصوت المبني للمجهول والحيوية والحالة ترتبط ارتباطًا وثيقًا بقرارات التصنيف ، مما يشير إلى أن mBERT لا يشفر الذاتية من الناحية التركيبية البحتة ، ولكن تضمين الذات هذا مستمر ويعتمد على الدلالات والخطاب العوامل ، كما هو مقترح في كثير من أدبيات علم اللغة الوظيفي. توفر هذه النتائج معًا نظرة ثاقبة حول كيفية ظهور السمات النحوية في التضمين السياقي\nفضاءات ، على مستوى تجريدي لم يغطه العمل السابق.', 'ja': '多言語BERT （ mBERT ）がどのように文法をエンコードするかを調べるために、形態構文アライメントの高次の文法的特徴（異なる言語が「主題」としてカウントするものをどのように定義するか）が異なる言語の埋め込み空間全体にどのように表現されるかを調べます。 形態素的アライメントが文脈的埋め込み空間に影響を与えるかどうか、どのように影響するかを理解するために、我々は分類子をトレーニングして、mBERT埋め込みの主題を移行文（形態素的アライメントに関する公然の情報を含まない）に回復させ、次にそれらを言語内および言語間の非移行文（主題の分類がアライメントに依存する場合）にゼロショットで評価します。 得られた分類子の分布は、それらのトレーニング言語の形態論的アライメントを反映していることがわかります。 私たちの結果は、mBERT表現が1つの入力文に表れていない高水準の文法的特徴の影響を受け、これが言語間で堅牢であることを示しています。 私たちの分類者が依存する特徴をさらに検討すると、受動的な声、アニメーション、ケースなどの特徴が分類決定と強く相関していることがわかり、mBERTが純粋に構文的に主観性をコードしているのではなく、主観性の埋め込みが連続的であり、意味論的および言語論的要因に依存していることが示唆され、機能言語学の文献の多くで提案されています。 これらの結果は、文脈埋め込みにおける文法的特徴がどのように現れるかについての洞察を提供します\n前作ではカバーされていない抽象化レベルのスペース。', 'pt': 'Investigamos como o BERT multilíngue (mBERT) codifica a gramática examinando como a característica gramatical de alta ordem do alinhamento morfossintático (como diferentes idiomas definem o que conta como um “assunto”) se manifesta nos espaços de incorporação de diferentes idiomas. Para entender se e como o alinhamento morfossintático afeta os espaços de embedding contextuais, treinamos classificadores para recuperar a subjetividade dos embeddings do mBERT em sentenças transitivas (que não contêm informações evidentes sobre o alinhamento morfossintático) e então as avaliamos como tiro zero em sentenças intransitivas (onde a classificação de subjetividade depende do alinhamento), dentro e entre idiomas. Descobrimos que as distribuições de classificadores resultantes refletem o alinhamento morfossintático de suas linguagens de treinamento. Nossos resultados demonstram que as representações mBERT são influenciadas por recursos gramaticais de alto nível que não se manifestam em nenhuma frase de entrada e que isso é robusto em todas as linguagens. Examinando ainda mais as características nas quais nossos classificadores confiam, descobrimos que características como voz passiva, animacy e case se correlacionam fortemente com as decisões de classificação, sugerindo que o mBERT não codifica a subjetividade puramente sintaticamente, mas que a incorporação da subjetividade é contínua e dependente da semântica e do discurso fatores, como é proposto em grande parte da literatura de linguística funcional. Juntos, esses resultados fornecem informações sobre como os recursos gramaticais se manifestam na incorporação contextual\nespaços, em um nível de abstração não coberto por trabalhos anteriores.', 'fr': "Nous étudions comment le BERT multilingue (mBERT) code la grammaire en examinant comment la caractéristique grammaticale d'ordre supérieur de l'alignement morphosyntaxique (comment différentes langues définissent ce qui compte comme un «\xa0sujet\xa0») se manifeste dans les espaces d'intégration de différentes langues. Pour comprendre si et comment l'alignement morphosyntaxique affecte les espaces d'inclusion contextuels, nous entraînons des classificateurs à récupérer le caractère subjectif des intégrations mBerT dans des phrases transitives (qui ne contiennent pas d'informations manifestes sur l'alignement morphosyntaxique), puis nous les évaluons sur des phrases intransitives ( où la classification des matières dépend de l'alignement), à l'intérieur et entre les langues. Nous trouvons que les distributions de classificateurs résultantes reflètent l'alignement morphosyntaxique de leurs langages d'apprentissage. Nos résultats démontrent que les représentations mBerT sont influencées par des caractéristiques grammaticales de haut niveau qui ne se manifestent dans aucune phrase d'entrée, et que cela est robuste dans toutes les langues. En examinant plus en détail les caractéristiques sur lesquelles s'appuient nos classificateurs, nous trouvons que des caractéristiques telles que la voix passive, l'animation et la casse sont fortement corrélées aux décisions de classification, suggérant que mBerT n'encode pas le sujet de façon purement syntaxique, mais que l'intégration de la matière est continue et dépend de sémantiques et discursifs, comme cela est proposé dans une grande partie de la littérature linguistique fonctionnelle. Ensemble, ces résultats fournissent un aperçu de la façon dont les caractéristiques grammaticales se manifestent dans l'intégration contextuelle\nespaces, à un niveau d'abstraction non couvert par les travaux précédents.", 'es': 'Investigamos cómo el BERT multilingüe (mBERT) codifica la gramática al examinar cómo la característica gramatical de alto orden de la alineación morfosintáctica (cómo los diferentes idiomas definen lo que se considera un «sujeto») se manifiesta en los espacios de incrustación de diferentes idiomas. Para entender si la alineación morfosintáctica afecta a los espacios de incrustación contextuales y cómo, entrenamos a los clasificadores para que recuperen la subjetividad de las incrustaciones de mBert en oraciones transitivas (que no contienen información abierta sobre la alineación morfosintáctica) y luego las evaluamos de forma cero en oraciones intransitivas ( donde la clasificación de la asignatura depende de la alineación), dentro de los idiomas y entre ellos. Encontramos que las distribuciones de clasificadores resultantes reflejan la alineación morfosintáctica de sus lenguajes de entrenamiento. Nuestros resultados demuestran que las representaciones de mBert están influenciadas por características gramaticales de alto nivel que no se manifiestan en ninguna oración de entrada, y que esto es sólido en todos los idiomas. Examinando más a fondo las características en las que se basan nuestros clasificadores, encontramos que características como la voz pasiva, la animatura y el caso se correlacionan fuertemente con las decisiones de clasificación, lo que sugiere que mBert no codifica la subjetividad puramente sintácticamente, sino que la incrustación de la subjetividad es continua y depende de semánticos y del discurso, como se propone en gran parte de la literatura sobre lingüística funcional. Juntos, estos resultados proporcionan información sobre cómo se manifiestan las características gramaticales en la incrustación contextual.\nespacios, en un nivel de abstracción no cubierto por trabajos anteriores.', 'zh': '论形句法齐之高阶语法(异言而定)题,异言而论BERT(mBERT)编码语法。 为解形句法对齐上下文嵌空,练类复mBERT嵌之主语(不含形句法信息),然后于言语跨语中对非传句(其主语类决于对齐)零次评。 以此观之,则分类之形句法齐矣。 吾之的结果表明,mBERT以高语法,一输一句,而壮于言。 益论吾器之所恃,见吾动语态,动画大小之所系,明mBERT不纯编码主语于句法,而嵌连于体,而赖于语义语,犹功能语言学文献之所建也。 赞曰∶供对语法之上下文嵌。\n空间,居前未涵盖之抽级。', 'ru': 'Мы исследуем, как многоязычный BERT (mBERT) кодирует грамматику, изучая, как грамматическая особенность высокого порядка морфосинтаксического выравнивания (как различные языки определяют то, что считается «субъектом») проявляется в пространствах вложений различных языков. Чтобы понять, влияет ли и как морфосинтаксическое выравнивание на контекстные пространства вложений, мы обучаем классификаторы восстанавливать субъектность вложений mBERT в переходных предложениях (которые не содержат открытой информации о морфосинтаксическом выравнивании), а затем оцениваем их нулевым снимком на непереходных предложениях (где классификация субъектности зависит от выравнивания), внутри и между языками. Мы обнаружили, что результирующие распределения классификаторов отражают морфосинтаксическое выравнивание их обучающих языков. Наши результаты показывают, что на представления mBERT влияют грамматические особенности высокого уровня, которые не проявляются ни в одном входном предложении, и что это является устойчивым для разных языков. Далее изучая характеристики, на которые опираются наши классификаторы, мы обнаруживаем, что такие признаки, как пассивный голос, анимация и регистр, сильно коррелируют с классификационными решениями, предполагая, что mBERT не кодирует субъектность чисто синтаксически, но что встраивание субъектности является непрерывным и зависит от семантических и дискурсивных факторов, как предлагается в большей части функциональной лингвистической литературы. Вместе эти результаты дают представление о том, как грамматические особенности проявляются в контекстуальном встраивании\nпространства, на уровне абстракции, не охваченном предыдущей работой.', 'ga': 'Déanaimid imscrúdú ar an gcaoi a n-ionchódaíonn BERT (mBERT) ilteangach gramadach trí scrúdú a dhéanamh ar an gcaoi a léirítear an ghné ard-ord gramadaí den ailíniú morphosyntactic (mar a shainíonn teangacha éagsúla cad is “ábhar”) thar spásanna leabaithe teangacha éagsúla. Chun a thuiscint an bhfuil tionchar ag ailíniú morphosyntactic ar spásanna leabaithe comhthéacsúla, cuirimid oiliúint ar aicmitheoirí chun suibiachtúlacht leabaithe mBERT in abairtí trasdula a aisghabháil (nach bhfuil faisnéis fhollasach ann faoi ailíniú morphosyntactic) agus ansin iad a mheas le lámhaigh nialasach ar abairtí neamh-idirthréimhseacha (nuair a dhéantar rangú suibiachtúlachta). ag brath ar ailíniú), laistigh de agus trasna teangacha. Faighimid amach go léiríonn na dáiltí aicmithe a bhíonn mar thoradh air sin ailíniú morphosyntacticeach a dteangacha oiliúna. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí go bhfuil tionchar ag léirithe mBERT ag gnéithe gramadaí ardleibhéil nach bhfuil le feiceáil in aon abairt ionchuir amháin, agus go bhfuil sé seo láidir trasna teangacha. Agus scrúdú breise á dhéanamh againn ar na saintréithe a mbíonn ár n-aicmitheoirí ag brath orthu, feicimid go bhfuil comhghaol idir gnéithe mar ghuth éighníomhach, beochan agus cás le cinntí aicmithe, rud a thugann le tuiscint nach ionchódaíonn MBERT an t-ábharachas go comhréir amháin, ach go bhfuil leabú suibiachtúlachta leanúnach agus ag brath ar shéimeantach agus dioscúrsa. fachtóirí, mar atá molta i gcuid mhaith de litríocht na teangeolaíochta feidhme. Le chéile, tugann na torthaí seo léargas ar an gcaoi a léirítear gnéithe gramadaí sa neadú comhthéacsúil\nspásanna, ag leibhéal astarraingthe nach bhfuil clúdaithe ag obair roimhe seo.', 'hi': 'हम जांच करते हैं कि बहुभाषी BERT (mBERT) व्याकरण को कैसे एन्कोड करता है, यह जांचकर कि morphosyntactic संरेखण की उच्च-क्रम व्याकरणिक विशेषता (विभिन्न भाषाएं कैसे परिभाषित करती हैं कि "विषय" के रूप में क्या मायने रखता है) विभिन्न भाषाओं के एम्बेडिंग रिक्त स्थान में प्रकट होता है। यह समझने के लिए कि क्या और कैसे morphosyntactic संरेखण प्रासंगिक एम्बेडिंग रिक्त स्थान को प्रभावित करता है, हम सकर्मक वाक्यों में mBERT एम्बेडिंग की subjecthood को पुनर्प्राप्त करने के लिए क्लासिफायरों को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं (जिसमें मोरफोसिंटैक्टिक संरेखण के बारे में अधिक जानकारी नहीं होती है) और फिर उन्हें अपरिवर्तनीय वाक्यों (जहां विषयता वर्गीकरण संरेखण पर निर्भर करता है) पर शून्य-शॉट का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, भाषाओं के भीतर और पार। हम पाते हैं कि परिणामी क्लासिफायर वितरण उनकी प्रशिक्षण भाषाओं के मोर्फोसिंटैक्टिक संरेखण को दर्शाते हैं। हमारे परिणाम दर्शाते हैं कि mBERT प्रतिनिधित्व उच्च-स्तरीय व्याकरणिक विशेषताओं से प्रभावित होते हैं जो किसी भी एक इनपुट वाक्य में प्रकट नहीं होते हैं, और यह भाषाओं में मजबूत है। आगे उन विशेषताओं की जांच करते हुए जिन पर हमारे क्लासिफायर्स भरोसा करते हैं, हम पाते हैं कि निष्क्रिय आवाज, एनीमेसी और केस जैसी विशेषताएं वर्गीकरण निर्णयों के साथ दृढ़ता से सहसंबंधित हैं, यह सुझाव देते हुए कि mBERT विशुद्ध रूप से वाक्यात्मक रूप से विषय को एन्कोड नहीं करता है, लेकिन यह कि विषयपरकता एम्बेडिंग निरंतर है और शब्दार्थ और प्रवचन कारकों पर निर्भर है, जैसा कि अधिकांश कार्यात्मक भाषाविज्ञान साहित्य में प्रस्तावित है। साथ में, ये परिणाम इस बात की अंतर्दृष्टि प्रदान करते हैं कि व्याकरणिक विशेषताएं प्रासंगिक एम्बेडिंग में कैसे प्रकट होती हैं\nरिक्त स्थान, अमूर्तता के एक स्तर पर पिछले काम द्वारा कवर नहीं किया गया है।', 'ka': 'სივრცე, აბსტრაქციის დონეში, რომელიც წინა სამუშაოდ არ აკეთებულია.', 'hu': 'a korábbi munka által nem fedett absztrakciós szinten.', 'el': 'χώρους, σε επίπεδο αφαίρεσης που δεν καλύπτεται από προηγούμενες εργασίες.', 'it': 'spazi, ad un livello di astrazione non coperto da lavori precedenti.', 'kk': 'алдыңғы жұмыс істемеген абстрактацияның деңгейінде бос орын.', 'mk': 'простори, на ниво на апстракција, кои не се покриени од претходната работа.', 'ms': 'ruang, pada tahap abstraksi yang tidak ditutup oleh kerja sebelumnya.', 'ml': 'മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലിയാല്\u200d ഒഴിഞ്ഞുപോകാത്ത സ്ഥലങ്ങള്\u200d.', 'lt': 'erdvės abstrakcijos lygiu, neįtrauktos į ankstesnį darbą.', 'mt': 'spazji, f’livell ta’ astrazzjoni mhux koperti minn xogħol preċedenti.', 'mn': 'аль хэдийн ажил дээр дүүрэхгүй газар.', 'no': 'mellomrom, på eit nivå av abstraksjon som ikkje dekket av førre arbeid.', 'pl': 'przestrzeni, na poziomie abstrakcji nieobjętym poprzednimi pracami.', 'ro': 'spații, la un nivel de abstracție care nu este acoperit de lucrările anterioare.', 'sr': 'prostora, na nivou apstrakcije koje ne pokrivaju prethodni rad.', 'so': 'goobaha aan ku daboolin shaqadii hore.', 'si': 'අවස්ථාවක්, කලින් වැඩේ වලින් අවස්ථාවක් නෑ.', 'sv': 'rum, på en abstraktionsnivå som inte täcks av tidigare arbeten.', 'ur': 'جگہ، اگلے کام کے ذریعہ سے نہیں پورے ہوئے آپٹراک کی سطح پر۔', 'ta': 'முந்தைய வேலையால் வெற்றிடங்கள் மூலம் மறைக்கப்படவில்லை.', 'uz': 'Biz ko\'plab tillar BERT (mBERT) grammatika qanday kodlash imkoniyatini aniqlashni o\'rganamiz. Morphosyntactic tashkilotlarining eng yuqori grammatikal imkoniyatlarini (oddiy soʻz deb aniqlashni qanday boshqa tillar qanday "mavzu" deb belgilanadi) turli tillar ichida koʻrsatiladi. Agar morphosyntactic tashkilotlarini qanday o\'zgartiradi, biz ta\'lim so\'zlarda mBERT tuzuvchilarni qayta olib tashlab o\'rganamiz, va keyin o\'z murakkab munosabatika haqida qo\'llanmagan so\'zlarni qiymatik qilamiz (ma\'lumotlar tasdiqlashga ishlatadi) va har xil tilda va har bir necha so\'zlar ichida. Biz o\'ylaymiz, natijada nashfiy tarqatish tarkibini o\'rganish tillarining morphosyntikk tarjima qilishini anglatadi. Our results demonstrate that mBERT representations are influenced by high-level grammatical features that are not manifested in any one input sentence, and that this is robust across languages.  Tafsilotlarimizning xususiyatlarimizni ko\'rib o\'rganamiz, maxfiy soʻzlar, animatika va xususiyatlarni darajalashtirish xususiyatlariga qismlashtirish mumkin, mBERT hodisa faqat birlashtirilganligiga kodlash mumkin, lekin ma\'lumot tuzilishi davom etiladi va semantik va suhbat factorilarga ishlatadi, qanday qilib ishlaydigan har doim tillar littatida. Bu natijalar davomida qanday grammatik xususiyatlarini ko\'rsatadi\nBoʻsh joylar oldingi ish bilan qo\'llanilmaydi.', 'vi': "Chúng tôi điều tra cách tổ hợp chữ thiếu niên mã ngữ pháp bằng cách xem xét các đặc trưng ngôn ngữ theo thứ tự của cấu hình morphine (cách các ngôn ngữ khác nhau xác định những thứ được gọi là'vật chủ') được phát biểu qua các khoảng nội bộ của ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Để hiểu rõ nếu và cách độ pha hoá tác động đến các khoảng cách trộn định giới chung xảy ra, chúng tôi đào tạo các phân loại để phục hồi chủ sở thích của mgert nhúng vào các câu mở (không chứa thông tin về sự định vị morphine) và sau đó đánh giá chúng bằng góc không theo các câu hỏi khó chịu (nơi phân loại thuộc vào sự định vị) trong và xuyên ngôn ngữ. Chúng tôi thấy phân phát phân loại kết quả phản ánh sự phối hình hài của ngôn ngữ huấn luyện. Kết quả của chúng tôi cho thấy các biểu tượng mBERT được ảnh hưởng bởi các đặc tính theo ngữ pháp cao cấp không phát biểu trong bất kỳ câu nhập nào, và nó mạnh mẽ xuyên qua các ngôn ngữ. Tiếp tục nghiên cứu các đặc điểm dựa vào các đặc điểm của chúng tôi, chúng tôi nhận thấy các tính chất như giọng động, hoạt động và trường hợp liên quan đến các quyết định phân loại, cho thấy mBERT không mã hóa chủ sở thích thuần túy chỉ liên tiếp, nhưng việc ghép chủ sở phụ thuộc vào các yếu tố văn học và ngôn ngữ. như được đề xuất trong hầu hết các văn học ngôn ngữ. Cùng nhau, những kết quả này cung cấp cái nhìn sâu sắc về các tính năng đặc trưng trong ngữ cảnh\nđịa điểm, ở mức độ trừu tượng không được bao gồm các tác phẩm trước.", 'hr': 'prostora, na razini apstraktacije koje ne pokrivaju prethodni rad.', 'nl': 'ruimtes, op een abstractieniveau dat niet door eerdere werken is bestreken.', 'bg': 'пространства, на ниво абстракция, което не е обхванато от предишна работа.', 'de': 'Räume, auf einer Abstraktionsebene, die von früheren Arbeiten nicht abgedeckt wurde.', 'da': 'rum, på et abstraktionsniveau, der ikke er omfattet af tidligere arbejde.', 'id': 'ruang, pada tingkat abstraksi yang tidak ditutup oleh pekerjaan sebelumnya.', 'fa': 'فضایی، در سطح خارج شدن که توسط کارهای قبلی پوشیده نشده است.', 'ko': '공간은 추상적인 차원에서 이전의 업무는 포함되지 않았다.', 'sq': 'hapësira, në një nivel abstrakti jo të mbuluar nga punët e mëparshme.', 'af': "spasies, op 'n vlak van abstraksie nie oordek deur vorige werk nie.", 'am': 'ቦታ', 'sw': 'nafasi, kwa kiwango cha kujitenga hakujazungumzwa na kazi iliyopita.', 'tr': 'seleňler,öňki işe tarapyndan janlaşmaýan seleňlerde.', 'az': 'uzaqlar, …ôvv…ôlki iŇüd…ôn √∂rt√ľnm…ôy…ôn abstraktiyanńĪn s…ôviyy…ôsind…ô.', 'bn': 'পূর্ববর্তী কাজের দ্বারা আটকানোর স্তরে স্থান।', 'bs': 'prostora, na nivou apstrakcije koje ne pokrivaju prethodni rad.', 'cs': 'prostory, na úrovni abstrakce, kterou nezahrnuje předchozí práce.', 'et': 'ruumid abstraktsiooni tasemel, mida varasemad tööd ei hõlma.', 'hy': 'տարածքներ, վերացման մակարդակի վրա, որոնք նախկին աշխատանքներով չեն ծածկված:', 'ca': "espais, a un nivell d'abstracció no cobert per treball anterior.", 'fi': 'tilat abstraktiotasolla, jota aikaisempi työ ei kata.', 'ha': "We investigate how Multilingual BERT (mBERT) encodes grammar by examining how the high-order grammatical feature of morphosyntactic alignment (how different languages define what counts as a 'subject') is manifested across the embedding spaces of different languages.  Domin ka fahimta idan da kuma yadda mutafasyntactic ya yi amfani da filayen da ke cikin kwanan faɗi, ko kuma za mu sanar da masallaci dõmin su canza ƙananan mBERT da za'a fitarwa cikin garwaya masu shige (wanda bã ya ƙunsa da wasu information game da juyi na mutane na morfosyntactic) kuma ka ƙaddara su sifo-shot a kan ƙananan da za'a guda (a lokacin da fassarar ƙanshi yana dõgara ga juyi), a guda da bakin harshe. Tuna gane cewa rabon da ke fassara fassara, suna cikin tsarin mutane da ke amfani da harshen su. MatamayinMu na nuna cewa misalin MBERT sun yi amfani da wasu fassarar sarrafiya masu grammati waɗanda ba a nuna cikin kõwa da aka shigar, kuma an kange shi a cikin wasu harshe. Ko bayan jarraba karatun da misalinmu ke dõgara, za mu gane cewa misalin sauti, animati da kashfa sunã da muhimmi da masu cire-gareshi, kuma yana gaya cewa mBERT bã ya kodi ƙananan da takarda kawai da haƙƙi, kuma amma an kamfata da ƙanshi yana daidai, kuma yana dõgara a kan fakta na semanti da mazaɓa, kamar da aka buƙace shi cikin littafan littafan aiki mai yawa. Duke da wannan matsala, za'a ga gane ka ga yadda grammatisk feature suka bayyana in a lokacin embedded\nfilayenaiki, da wata daraja na kando bai rufe su da aikin da aka riga ba.", 'sk': "Raziskujemo, kako večjezični BERT (mBERT) kodira slovnico, tako da preučimo, kako se slovnična značilnost morfosintaktične poravnave visokega reda (kako različni jeziki definirajo, kaj šteje kot 'subjekt') manifestira v vgradnih prostorih različnih jezikov. Da bi razumeli, ali in kako morfosintaktična poravnava vpliva na kontekstualne prostore vgradnje, usposabljamo klasifikatorje, da obnovijo subjekt vdelav mBERT v tranzitivnih stavkih (ki ne vsebujejo očitnih informacij o morfosintaktični poravnavi) in jih nato ocenijo ničelno na intraobčutljivih stavkih (kjer je razvrstitev subjekta odvisna od poravnave), znotraj jezikov in med njimi. Ugotavljamo, da nastale razporeditve klasifikatorjev odražajo morfosintaktično poravnavo njihovih jezikov usposabljanja. Naši rezultati kažejo, da na reprezentacije mBERT vplivajo slovnične značilnosti visoke ravni, ki se ne kažejo v nobenem vhodnem stavku, in da je to robustno v vseh jezikih. Nadaljnje preučevanje značilnosti, na katere se zanašajo naši klasifikatorji, ugotavljamo, da značilnosti, kot so pasivni glas, animacija in primer, močno povezujejo z odločitvami o klasifikaciji, kar kaže, da mBERT subjektov ne kodira zgolj sintaktično, ampak da je vključevanje subjektov neprekinjeno in odvisno od semantičnih in diskurznih dejavnikov, Kot je predlagano v večini funkcionalne jezikoslovne literature. Ti rezultati skupaj zagotavljajo vpogled v to, kako se slovnične značilnosti pojavljajo v kontekstni vdelavi\nprostori, na ravni abstrakcije, ki ni zajeta v predhodnem delu.", 'jv': "Awak dhéwé yatêstih pirsaké Multilanguage BERT (mBERT) nggawe gram atik dadi, perusahaan langkung sampeyan babagan kelas-order gram atik dhéwé. Terasai awak dhéwé, piye soko sak, ngéwé, piye basa luwih-tentang cara nggawe nguasai perusahaan mBERT embedding kapan kanggo Kemerdekaan kapan ginar Awak dhéwé éntuk tanggal dipuluhaan neng akeh basa luwih nyelarane Rejaliane kita ngomongke tindong mBERT kang diputaaken kelangan anyar sampeyan anyar tentang Ngawe luwih-luwih akeh cara sing kelas nang kelas telas telas, awak dhéwé luwih karo ngono kuwi kalem sewih dumadhi lan kelas kuwi kesempatan dhéwé, nggunakake mBERT kuwi pak akeh apat karo perusahaan sing wis ngerasakno Where's the embedding of Subject is susahe lan sak ujaran karo koyo sematik lan mulalah Ing yèn ngomongke karo akeh liyane ing resmi ingkang éntuk. Name\nechoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world", 'he': "We investigate how Multilingual BERT (mBERT) encodes grammar by examining how the high-order grammatical feature of morphosyntactic alignment (how different languages define what counts as a 'subject') is manifested across the embedding spaces of different languages.  כדי להבין אם והכיצד התאמה מורפוסינטקטית משפיעה על חלקי התאמה קונטקסטיים, אנו מאמנים מסווגים כדי לשחזר את הנושא של התאמות mBERT במשפטים מעברים (שאינם מכילים מידע ברור על התאמה מורפוסינטקטית) ואז להעריך אותם אפס-ירי על משפטים בלתי רגישים (שבו מסווג הנושא תלוי על התאמה), בתוך ושלבים. אנחנו מוצאים שהפיצוצים המקבלים משקפים את ההתאמה המורפוסינטקטית של שפות האימון שלהם. התוצאות שלנו מראות כי מייצגים mBERT משפיעים על ידי תכונות גרמטיות ברמה גבוהה שלא מופיעים בשום משפט כניסה אחד, וזה חזק בכל שפות. בדקות נוספות של האופיינים שהקלאסיפורים שלנו סומכים עליהם, אנו מוצאים כי אופיינים כמו קול פסיבי, אנימציה ומקרה מתחברים חזק להחלטות קלאסיפציה, מציעים כי mBERT לא קוד נושאות טהור סינטאקטית, אלא שהקישום הנושא הוא ממשיך ומתלוי על גורמים סמנטיים ודיורסים, כפי שנמצא ברוב הספרות השפתיים המפעילות. יחד, התוצאות האלה מספקות הבנה איך תכונות גרמטיות מתגלות בתכנית קונטקטואלית\nמקומות, ברמה של אסטראקציה שלא מכוסים על ידי עבודה קודמת.", 'bo': "We investigate how Multilingual BERT (mBERT) encodes grammar by examining how the high-order grammatical feature of morphosyntactic alignment (how different languages define what counts as a 'subject') is manifested across the embedding spaces of different languages. To understand if and how morphosyntactic alignment affects contextual embedding spaces, we train classifiers to recover the subjecthood of mBERT embeddings in transitive sentences (which do not contain overt information about morphosyntactic alignment) and then evaluate them zero-shot on intransitive sentences (where subjecthood classification depends on alignment), within and across languages. ང་ཚོས་དབྱེ་བ་གྱི་དབྱེ་བ་རྩིས་ཆ་ཚོའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་བ་དང་མཐུན་གྱི་གྲལ་སྒྲིག་མཐུན་ཡོད་པ་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་འབྲུག་འབྲས་མངོན་གསལ ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་རིག སྐད་རིགས་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ལ་བསམ་བྱས་པ་ལྟར། མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུས་ན། གྲུབ་འབྲས་འདི་ཚོས་རྣམ་གྲངས་རིམ་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་\nས་གནས་ས།"}
{'en': 'DOCENT : Learning Self-Supervised Entity Representations from Large Document Collections', 'ar': 'الوثيقة: تعلم تمثيلات الكيانات الخاضعة للإشراف الذاتي من مجموعات المستندات الكبيرة', 'fr': "DOCENT\xa0: apprentissage des représentations d'entités auto-supervisées à partir de collections de documents volumineux", 'es': 'DOCENT: Aprendizaje de representaciones de entidades autosupervisadas de grandes colecciones de documentos', 'pt': 'DOCENT: Aprendendo Representações de Entidades Auto-Supervisionadas de Grandes Coleções de Documentos', 'hi': 'DOCENT: बड़े दस्तावेज़ संग्रह से स्व-पर्यवेक्षित एंटिटी अभ्यावेदन सीखना', 'zh': 'DOCENT:大文档,学自监也', 'ja': 'ドキュメント:大規模なドキュメントコレクションからの自主監督のエンティティ表現の学習', 'ru': 'ДОЦЕНТ: Изучение представлений самоконтролируемых организаций из больших коллекций документов', 'ga': 'DOCENT: Ag Foghlaim Léiriúcháin Aonáin Féinmhaoirsithe ó Bhailiúcháin Cáipéisí Móra', 'ka': 'DOCENT: საკუთარი დოკუმენტის კოლექციებიდან საკუთარი თავიდან დამუშავებული ელექტის გამოსახულება', 'el': 'DOCENT: Μάθηση Αυτοεποπτευόμενων Αντιπροσωπειών Οντότητας από μεγάλες συλλογές εγγράφων', 'hu': 'DOCENT: Az 철nfel체gyelet alatt 찼ll처 entit찼sok megtanul찼sa nagy dokumentumgy킥jtem챕nyekb흷l', 'lt': 'Dokumentas: Mokymasis savarankiškai prižiūrimų subjektų atstovybėmis iš didelių dokumentų rinkinių', 'it': 'DOCENT: Imparare le rappresentazioni di entità auto-supervisionate da grandi collezioni di documenti', 'kk': 'DOCENT: Өзінің бақылау нысандарын үлкен құжат жинақтарынан үйрену', 'mk': 'Доцент: Научи самонадгледувани претставувања на ентитетите од големите колекции документи', 'ms': 'DOCENT: Belajar Perwakilan Entiti Dipengawasi Sendiri dari Kumpulan Dokumen Besar', 'mn': 'DOCENT: Өөрийгөө хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдсөн байгууллагуудын суралцах', 'mt': 'DOĊENT: Tagħlim Rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ Entitajiet Awto-Sorveljati minn Ġbir ta’ Dokumenti Kbar', 'ml': 'DOCENT: സ്വയം പരിപാലിക്കപ്പെട്ട എന്റിറ്റി പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'no': 'DOCENT: Læring av sjølvovervakte einingsrepresentasjonar frå store dokumentsamlingar', 'pl': 'DOCENT: Uczenie się samodzielnie nadzorowanych reprezentacji podmiotów z dużych zbiorów dokumentów', 'ro': 'DOCENT: Învățarea reprezentărilor entităților auto-supravegheate din colecții mari de documente', 'sr': 'Učenje predstavljanja samog nadzornog područja iz velikih kolekcija dokumenta', 'sv': 'DOCENT: Att lära sig självövervakade enhetsrepresentationer från stora dokumentsamlingar', 'so': 'DOCENT: Learning Self-Supervised Entity Representations from Large Document Collections', 'si': 'DOCENT: ලොකු ලිපින්ත සංවිධානයෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය සංවිධානය ඉගෙනගන්න', 'ta': 'DOCENT: பெரிய ஆவண தொகுப்பு', 'ur': 'DOCENT: اپنے اوپر نظارت کی Entity Representations from Large Document Collections', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Học về các đơn vị tự giám sát từ Tập đoàn Tài liệu lớn', 'da': 'DOCENT: Læring af selvtilsynede enhedsrepræsentationer fra store dokumentsamlinger', 'bg': 'Учене на представителства на самоконтролирани субекти от големи колекции документи', 'nl': 'DOCENT: Zelfbegeleide entiteitsvertegenwoordigingen leren van grote documentcollecties', 'hr': 'DOCENT: Naučenje predstavljanja samog nadzornog područja iz velikih skupina dokumenta', 'de': 'DOCENT: SelbstĂ¼berwachte EntitĂ¤tsreprĂ¤sentationen aus groĂŸen Dokumentensammlungen lernen', 'id': 'DOCENT: Belajar Perwakilan Entitas Dipengawasi Sendiri dari Koleksi Dokumen Besar', 'fa': 'DOCENT: یاد گرفتن نمایش\u200cهای واحد خودکنترل از مجموعه\u200cهای سند بزرگ', 'ko': '해설자: 대형 문서 집합에서 자기 감독의 실체 표시를 배운다', 'tr': 'part-type', 'sw': 'HABARI: Kujifunza Wawakilishi wa Ujumbe wa kujitegemea kutoka Makusanyiko Makubwa', 'af': 'DOCENT: Onderleer Selfbesig Entiteit voorstellings van Groot Dokument Versamelings', 'sq': 'DOCENT: Mësoni përfaqësime të njësisë vetëmbikqyrure nga koleksionet e mëdha të dokumenteve', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'DOCENT: Büyük Döküman Kolleksiyonlarından Öz Gözləşdirilmiş Öz Özünü Gözləşdirilmiş Öz Özünü Öyrənmək', 'bn': 'বিশাল নথি সংগ্রহ থেকে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভিস্ট এন্টিটি প্রতিনিধি শিখানো', 'bs': 'DOCENT: Učenje predstavljanja samog nadzornog područja iz velikih kolekcija dokumenta', 'cs': 'DOCENT: Učení se zastoupení subjektů s vlastním dohledem z velkých sbírek dokumentů', 'ca': "DOCENT: Aprendre representacions d'entitats auto-supervisades a partir de grans col·leccions de documents", 'et': 'DOCENT: Isejärelevalvega üksuste esinduste õppimine suurtest dokumentide kogudest', 'fi': 'DOCENT: Itsevalvottujen yksiköiden edustustojen oppiminen suurista asiakirjakokoelmista', 'hy': 'Սովորեցնել ինքնավերահսկվող հասարակությունների ներկայացումներ մեծ փաստաթղթերի հավաքածուներից', 'he': 'מדוקנט: ללמוד מייצגים של יחידות משגיחות עצמיות מאוספי מסמכים גדולים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'DOCENT: Učenje samonadzorovanih predstavništev subjektov iz velikih zbirk dokumentov', 'jv': 'DODETT: Learning Self-super-Entty representations from big document collations', 'bo': 'DOCENT: རང་ཉིད་ལྟ་རྟོག་པའི་སྒེར་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་མངོན་པོ་ཞིག་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་ཆེ་ཆུང་ཚན་ནས་བསླབས་སྐབས'}
{'en': 'This paper explores learning rich self-supervised entity representations from large amounts of associated text. Once pre-trained, these models become applicable to multiple entity-centric tasks such as ranked retrieval, knowledge base completion, question answering, and more. Unlike other methods that harvest self-supervision signals based merely on a local context within a sentence, we radically expand the notion of context to include any available text related to an entity. This enables a new class of powerful, high-capacity representations that can ultimately distill much of the useful information about an entity from multiple text sources, without any human supervision. We present several training strategies that, unlike prior approaches, learn to jointly predict words and entities   strategies we compare experimentally on downstream tasks in the TV-Movies domain, such as MovieLens tag prediction from user reviews and natural language movie search. As evidenced by results, our models match or outperform competitive baselines, sometimes with little or no fine-tuning, and are also able to scale to very large corpora. Finally, we make our datasets and pre-trained models publicly available. This includes Reviews2Movielens, mapping the ~1B word corpus of Amazon movie reviews (He and McAuley, 2016) to MovieLens tags (Harper and Konstan, 2016), as well as Reddit Movie Suggestions with natural language queries and corresponding community recommendations.', 'ar': 'تستكشف هذه الورقة تعلم تمثيلات كيانات غنية خاضعة للإشراف الذاتي من كميات كبيرة من النص المرتبط. بمجرد تدريبها مسبقًا ، تصبح هذه النماذج قابلة للتطبيق على مهام متعددة تتمحور حول الكيانات مثل الاسترداد المرتبة وإكمال قاعدة المعرفة والإجابة على الأسئلة والمزيد. على عكس الطرق الأخرى التي تجمع إشارات الإشراف الذاتي بناءً فقط على سياق محلي داخل جملة ، نقوم بتوسيع مفهوم السياق بشكل جذري ليشمل أي نص متاح متعلق بالكيان. يتيح ذلك فئة جديدة من التمثيلات القوية عالية السعة التي يمكنها في النهاية استخلاص الكثير من المعلومات المفيدة حول كيان من مصادر نصية متعددة ، دون أي إشراف بشري. نقدم العديد من استراتيجيات التدريب التي ، على عكس الأساليب السابقة ، تتعلم كيفية التنبؤ المشترك بالكلمات والكيانات - الاستراتيجيات التي نقارنها تجريبيًا في المهام النهائية في مجال الأفلام التلفزيونية ، مثل توقع علامة MovieLens من مراجعات المستخدم والبحث عن الأفلام بلغة طبيعية. كما يتضح من النتائج ، تتطابق نماذجنا مع خطوط الأساس التنافسية أو تتفوق عليها ، أحيانًا مع القليل من الضبط الدقيق أو بدون ضبطها ، كما أنها قادرة على توسيع نطاق الشركات الكبيرة جدًا. أخيرًا ، نجعل مجموعات البيانات والنماذج المدربة مسبقًا متاحة للجمهور. يتضمن ذلك Reviews2Movielens ، وتعيين مجموعة كلمات 1B تقريبًا لمراجعات أفلام Amazon (He and McAuley ، 2016) إلى علامات MovieLens (Harper and Konstan ، 2016) ، بالإضافة إلى اقتراحات أفلام Reddit مع استعلامات اللغة الطبيعية وتوصيات المجتمع المقابلة.', 'pt': 'Este artigo explora o aprendizado de representações ricas de entidades autossupervisionadas a partir de grandes quantidades de texto associado. Depois de pré-treinados, esses modelos se tornam aplicáveis a várias tarefas centradas na entidade, como recuperação classificada, conclusão da base de conhecimento, resposta a perguntas e muito mais. Ao contrário de outros métodos que coletam sinais de autosupervisão baseados apenas em um contexto local dentro de uma frase, expandimos radicalmente a noção de contexto para incluir qualquer texto disponível relacionado a uma entidade. Isso permite uma nova classe de representações poderosas e de alta capacidade que podem, em última análise, destilar muitas das informações úteis sobre uma entidade de várias fontes de texto, sem qualquer supervisão humana. Apresentamos várias estratégias de treinamento que, ao contrário das abordagens anteriores, aprendem a prever conjuntamente palavras e entidades – estratégias que comparamos experimentalmente em tarefas downstream no domínio TV-Filmes, como previsão de tags MovieLens a partir de comentários de usuários e pesquisa de filmes em linguagem natural. Conforme evidenciado pelos resultados, nossos modelos correspondem ou superam as linhas de base competitivas, às vezes com pouco ou nenhum ajuste fino, e também são capazes de escalar para corpora muito grandes. Por fim, disponibilizamos publicamente nossos conjuntos de dados e modelos pré-treinados. Isso inclui Reviews2Movielens, mapeando o corpus de palavras de ~1B de resenhas de filmes da Amazon (He e McAuley, 2016) para tags MovieLens (Harper e Konstan, 2016), bem como Sugestões de filmes do Reddit com consultas de linguagem natural e recomendações da comunidade correspondentes.', 'es': 'Este artículo explora el aprendizaje de representaciones de entidades autosupervisadas a partir de grandes cantidades de texto asociado. Una vez entrenados previamente, estos modelos se pueden aplicar a múltiples tareas centradas en la entidad, como la recuperación clasificada, la finalización de la base de conocimientos, la respuesta a preguntas y más. A diferencia de otros métodos que recogen señales de autosupervisión basadas únicamente en un contexto local dentro de una oración, ampliamos radicalmente la noción de contexto para incluir cualquier texto disponible relacionado con una entidad. Esto permite una nueva clase de representaciones poderosas y de alta capacidad que, en última instancia, pueden destilar gran parte de la información útil sobre una entidad a partir de múltiples fuentes de texto, sin ninguna supervisión humana. Presentamos varias estrategias de capacitación que, a diferencia de los enfoques anteriores, aprenden a predecir palabras y entidades de manera conjunta, estrategias que comparamos experimentalmente en tareas posteriores en el dominio de películas de televisión, como la predicción de etiquetas de MovieLens a partir de reseñas de usuarios y la búsqueda de películas en lenguaje natural. Como lo demuestran los resultados, nuestros modelos coinciden o superan a las líneas de base de la competencia, a veces con poco o ningún ajuste, y también pueden escalar a cuerpos muy grandes. Por último, ponemos a disposición del público nuestros conjuntos de datos y modelos previamente entrenados. Esto incluye Reviews2Movielens, que mapea el corpus de ~ mil millones de palabras de reseñas de películas de Amazon (Él y McAuley, 2016) a etiquetas de MovieLens (Harper y Konstan, 2016), así como sugerencias de películas de Reddit con consultas en lenguaje natural y las recomendaciones de la comunidad correspondientes.', 'fr': "Cet article explore l'apprentissage de riches représentations d'entités auto-supervisées à partir de grandes quantités de texte associé. Une fois pré-formés, ces modèles deviennent applicables à de multiples tâches centrées sur l'entité, telles que la récupération classée, la complétion de la base de connaissances, la réponse aux questions, etc. Contrairement à d'autres méthodes qui collectent des signaux d'auto-supervision basés uniquement sur un contexte local dans une phrase, nous élargissons radicalement la notion de contexte pour inclure tout texte disponible lié à une entité. Cela permet de créer une nouvelle classe de représentations puissantes et de grande capacité qui peuvent ultimement distiller une grande partie des informations utiles sur une entité à partir de plusieurs sources de texte, sans aucune supervision humaine. Nous présentons plusieurs stratégies de formation qui, contrairement aux approches précédentes, apprennent à prédire conjointement des mots et des entités — des stratégies que nous comparons expérimentalement sur des tâches en aval dans le domaine des films télévisés, telles que la prédiction de balises MovieLens à partir des avis des utilisateurs et la recherche de films en langage naturel. Comme le montrent les résultats, nos modèles correspondent ou surpassent les niveaux de référence concurrentiels, parfois avec peu ou pas de réglages précis, et sont également capables de s'adapter à de très grands corpus. Enfin, nous mettons nos ensembles de données et nos modèles préentraînés à la disposition du public. Cela inclut Reviews2Movielens, mappant le corpus de mots ~1B des critiques de films Amazon (He et McAuley, 2016) aux balises MovieLens (Harper et Konstan, 2016), ainsi que Reddit Movie Suggestions avec des requêtes en langage naturel et les recommandations de la communauté correspondantes.", 'zh': '本文探讨了怎么从大相关文本中学习自己的实体。 先期训练,宜用实体为务,如检索、知识库成、问答等。 与他句之局上下文以自督之法不同,广上下文之名,以包实体之本。 此一新强大之高容量,终可取诸文本源中实体者多用信息,而无一人工监督也。 臣等敷练数策,与前法不同,此策学共占单词实 - 臣等实验性较于TV-Movies领之下流,如用户论自然语言电影搜索MovieLens标占。 若其效也,模形与竞基线相匹优于竞基线,或鲜本无微,而犹能广及大语料库。 最后,我将数据集和预先训练的模样。 凡Reviews2Movielens,以亚马逊电影论(He and McAuley,2016)约10亿个单词语料库映射MovieLens标签(HarperKonstan,2016),及带自然语言询应社区荐Reddit电影议。', 'ja': 'この論文では、大量の関連するテキストから豊富な自主監督された実体表現を学習することを探求する。 事前トレーニングを受けると、これらのモデルは、ランク付けされた検索、ナレッジベースの完了、質問への回答など、複数のエンティティ中心のタスクに適用可能になります。 文章内のローカルコンテキストのみに基づいて自己監視信号を収集する他の方法とは異なり、コンテキストの概念を抜本的に拡張して、エンティティに関連する利用可能なテキストを含むようにします。 これにより、人間の監督なしに、複数のテキストソースからエンティティに関する有用な情報の多くを最終的に抽出できる、強力で大容量の新しいクラスの表現が可能になります。 私たちは、以前のアプローチとは異なり、単語とエンティティを共同で予測することを学ぶいくつかのトレーニング戦略を提示しています。これは、ユーザーレビューからのMovieLensタグ予測や自然言語の映画検索など、テレビ–映画ドメインのダウンストリームタスクで実験的に比較する戦略です。 結果から証明されているように、当社のモデルは競合ベースラインと一致するか、または競合ベースラインを上回り、微調整がほとんどまたはまったく行われていない場合があります。また、非常に大きなコーポラにスケーリングすることもできます。 最後に、データセットと事前にトレーニングされたモデルを公開します。 これには、レビュー2ムービーレンズ、Amazonムービーレビューの~ 1 Bワードコーパス（ He and McAuley, 2016 ）をMovieLensタグにマッピング（ Harper and Konstan, 2016 ）、自然言語のクエリと対応するコミュニティの推奨事項を含むRedditムービーの提案が含まれます。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर बड़ी मात्रा में संबद्ध पाठ से समृद्ध स्व-पर्यवेक्षित इकाई अभ्यावेदन सीखने की पड़ताल करता है। एक बार पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित होने के बाद, ये मॉडल कई इकाई-केंद्रित कार्यों पर लागू हो जाते हैं जैसे कि रैंक पुनर्प्राप्ति, नॉलेज बेस पूरा होना, प्रश्न उत्तर देना, और बहुत कुछ। अन्य तरीकों के विपरीत जो एक वाक्य के भीतर केवल एक स्थानीय संदर्भ के आधार पर आत्म-पर्यवेक्षण संकेतों की कटाई करते हैं, हम किसी इकाई से संबंधित किसी भी उपलब्ध पाठ को शामिल करने के लिए संदर्भ की धारणा का मौलिक रूप से विस्तार करते हैं। यह शक्तिशाली, उच्च क्षमता वाले प्रतिनिधित्व के एक नए वर्ग को सक्षम बनाता है जो अंततः किसी भी मानव पर्यवेक्षण के बिना, कई पाठ स्रोतों से एक इकाई के बारे में उपयोगी जानकारी का अधिकांश भाग डिस्टिल कर सकता है। हम कई प्रशिक्षण रणनीतियों को प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जो पूर्व दृष्टिकोणों के विपरीत, संयुक्त रूप से शब्दों और संस्थाओं की भविष्यवाणी करना सीखते हैं - रणनीतियों की तुलना हम टीवी-मूवीज़ डोमेन में डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्यों पर प्रयोगात्मक रूप से करते हैं, जैसे कि उपयोगकर्ता समीक्षाओं और प्राकृतिक भाषा फिल्म खोज से MovieLens टैग भविष्यवाणी। जैसा कि परिणामों से स्पष्ट है, हमारे मॉडल प्रतिस्पर्धी बेसलाइन से मेल खाते हैं या बेहतर प्रदर्शन करते हैं, कभी-कभी कम या कोई ठीक-ट्यूनिंग के साथ, और बहुत बड़े कॉर्पोरेट को स्केल करने में भी सक्षम होते हैं। अंत में, हम अपने डेटासेट और पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित मॉडल को सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध कराते हैं। इसमें Reviews2Movielens शामिल हैं, अमेज़ॅन मूवी समीक्षाओं (वह और McAuley, 2016) के ~ 1B शब्द कॉर्पस को MovieLens टैग (हार्पर और कॉन्स्टन, 2016) के साथ-साथ प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रश्नों और संबंधित सामुदायिक सिफारिशों के साथ Reddit मूवी सुझावों का मानचित्रण करना।', 'ru': 'В этом документе исследуется изучение богатых представлений самоконтролируемых сущностей из больших объемов связанного текста. После предварительного обучения эти модели становятся применимыми к нескольким ориентированным на сущность задачам, таким как ранжированный поиск, заполнение базы знаний, ответы на вопросы и многое другое. В отличие от других методов, которые генерируют сигналы самоконтроля, основанные только на локальном контексте в предложении, мы радикально расширяем понятие контекста, чтобы включить любой доступный текст, связанный с сущностью. Это позволяет создать новый класс мощных, мощных представлений, которые в конечном итоге могут извлечь большую часть полезной информации о сущности из нескольких текстовых источников без какого-либо человеческого надзора. Мы представляем несколько тренировочных стратегий, которые, в отличие от предыдущих подходов, учатся совместно предсказывать слова и сущности – стратегии, которые мы сравниваем экспериментально с последующими задачами в домене TV-Movies, такими как предсказание тегов MovieLens из отзывов пользователей и поиск фильмов на естественном языке. Как показывают результаты, наши модели соответствуют или превосходят конкурентные базовые линии, иногда с незначительной или вообще без точной настройки, а также способны масштабироваться на очень большие корпорации. Наконец, мы делаем наши наборы данных и предварительно подготовленные модели общедоступными. Это включает в себя Reviews2Movielens, сопоставление ~ 1B-слова корпуса отзывов Amazon (He and McAuley, 2016) с тегами MovieLens (Harper and Konstan, 2016), а также Reddit Movie Suggestions с запросами на естественном языке и соответствующими рекомендациями сообщества.', 'ga': 'Scrúdaíonn an páipéar seo léiriúcháin saibhir aonáin féinmhaoirsithe a fhoghlaim ó mhéideanna móra téacs gaolmhar. Nuair a bhíonn na samhlacha seo réamh-oilte, beidh feidhm ag na samhlacha seo maidir le tascanna iolracha-aonán-lárnach amhail aisghabháil rangaithe, críochnú bonn eolais, freagra ceisteanna, agus go leor eile. Murab ionann agus modhanna eile a bhaintear amach comharthaí féinmhaoirseachta bunaithe ar chomhthéacs áitiúil laistigh d’abairt amháin, leathnaímid go radacach coincheap an chomhthéacs chun aon téacs atá ar fáil a bhaineann le haonán a chur san áireamh. Cumasaíonn sé seo aicme nua léiriúcháin chumhachtacha ard-acmhainne ar féidir leo, ar deireadh thiar, go leor den fhaisnéis úsáideach faoi eintiteas a dhriogadh ó fhoinsí iolracha téacs, gan aon mhaoirseacht dhaonna. Cuirimid roinnt straitéisí oiliúna i láthair a fhoghlaimíonn, murab ionann agus cur chuigí roimhe seo, focail agus eintitis a thuar le chéile – straitéisí a ndéanaimid comparáid turgnamhach ar thascanna iartheachtacha i bhfearann TV-Scannáin, mar thuar clib MovieLens ó léirmheasanna úsáideoirí agus cuardach scannán i dteanga nádúrtha. Mar is léir ó thorthaí, tá ár samhlacha ag teacht le nó ag sárú na mbonnlínte iomaíocha, uaireanta gan mionchoigeartú nó gan aon mhionchoigeartú ar bith, agus is féidir leo scála go corparáid an-mhór. Ar deireadh, cuirimid ár dtacar sonraí agus ár múnlaí réamhoilte ar fáil go poiblí. Áiríonn sé seo Reviews2Movielens, ag mapáil corpas focal ~1B de léirmheasanna scannáin Amazon (He agus McAuley, 2016) go clibeanna MovieLens (Harper agus Konstan, 2016), chomh maith le Moltaí Scannán Reddit le ceisteanna teanga nádúrtha agus moltaí pobail comhfhreagracha.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány a gazdag, önfelügyelt entitások ábrázolását vizsgálja nagy mennyiségű kapcsolódó szövegből. Az előzetes képzés után ezek a modellek több entitás-központú feladatra is alkalmazhatók, mint például rangsorolt visszakeresés, tudásbázis kiegészítés, kérdésválasz stb. Más módszerekkel ellentétben, amelyek pusztán egy mondat helyi kontextusán alapuló önfelügyeleti jeleket gyűjtenek össze, radikálisan kiterjesztjük a kontextus fogalmát az entitáshoz kapcsolódó rendelkezésre álló szövegekre. Ez lehetővé teszi az erőteljes, nagy kapacitású reprezentációk új osztályát, amelyek végül egy entitással kapcsolatos hasznos információk nagy részét több szövegforrásból, emberi felügyelet nélkül lepárolják. Számos olyan képzési stratégiát mutatunk be, amelyek a korábbi megközelítésektől eltérően megtanulják közösen megjósolni a szavakat és entitásokat - olyan stratégiákat, amelyeket kísérletileg összehasonlítunk a TV-Filmek domain downstream feladataival kapcsolatban, mint például a MovieLens címkék előrejelzése felhasználói értékelésekből és a természetes nyelvű filmkeresés. Amint azt az eredmények is bizonyítják, modelleink megfelelnek vagy felülmúlják a versenyképes alapvonalakat, néha kevés vagy semmilyen finomhangolással, és képesek nagyon nagy corporákra skálázni. Végül nyilvánosan hozzáférhetővé tesszük adatkészleteinket és előre képzett modelleinket. Ez magában foglalja a Reviews2Movielens, amely az Amazon filmértékelések ~1B szókorpuszát (He és McAuley, 2016) MovieLens címkékkel (Harper és Konstan, 2016), valamint a Reddit Movie Javaslatokat természetes nyelvű lekérdezésekkel és a megfelelő közösségi ajánlásokkal társítja.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი განსხვავებს ბედნიერი თავიდან დამუშავებული ინტერტიკის გამოსახულებების დიდი რაოდენობებიდან. მაშინ, როდესაც წინ განაკეთებულია, ეს მოდელები გადაყენებულია მრავალ ინტერტიკური ცენტრიკური დავალებისთვის, როგორც რენექტირებული მიღება, ცნობიერი ბაზის დასრულება,  სხვა მეთოდის განსხვავებაში, რომელიც თავიდან დავამუშავებს სიგნალები მხოლოდ ლოკალური კონტექსტზე მხოლოდ, ჩვენ პაეთიკურად კონტექსტურის წარმოდგენა, რომ ყველა ხელმისა ეს შესაძლებელია ახალი კლასი ძლიერი, მეტი კანოსტაციის გამოსახულებები, რომელიც შეუძლებელია საკუთარ შესაძლებელი ინფორმაციის უფრო გამოსახულებელი ინფორმაციის შესახებ განსხვ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ რამდენიმე სტრატიგური სტრატიგური სტრატიგურები, რომლებიც წინასწორედ წინასწორედ წინასწორებული სიტყვების და ინტერტიგურების შესახებ - სტრატიგური სტრატიგურები, რომლებიც ტელეგი-ფილმის დემონი როგორც წარმოდგენებით, ჩვენი მოდელები თანამდგენა ან გავაკეთება კონპექტიური ფესური ხაზები, როგორც ცოტა ან არაფერი კონპექტიური ხაზებით, და შეუძლიათ გავაკ საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ ჩვენი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციას და საბოლოოდ მოდელების შესაძლებლობა. ეს აქვს Reviews2Movielens, რომელიც ამოზაციონის ფილმის რევისტურების ~1B სიტყვების კოპპუსი (He and McAuley, 2016) FilmLens Tags (Harper and Konstan, 2016), და Reddit Film Suggestions with natural language queries and corresponding community recommendations.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία διερευνά την εκμάθηση πλούσιων αυτοεποπτικών αναπαραστάσεων οντοτήτων από μεγάλες ποσότητες συναφούς κειμένου. Μόλις προετοιμαστούν, αυτά τα μοντέλα μπορούν να εφαρμοστούν σε πολλαπλές εργασίες κεντρικής οντότητας, όπως η ανάκτηση κατάταξης, η ολοκλήρωση της βάσης γνώσεων, η απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις και πολλά άλλα. Σε αντίθεση με άλλες μεθόδους που συλλέγουν σήματα αυτοεπίβλεψης βασισμένα μόνο σε ένα τοπικό πλαίσιο μέσα σε μια πρόταση, επεκτείνουμε ριζικά την έννοια του πλαισίου για να συμπεριλάβουμε οποιοδήποτε διαθέσιμο κείμενο σχετικό με μια οντότητα. Αυτό επιτρέπει μια νέα κατηγορία ισχυρών αναπαραστάσεων υψηλής χωρητικότητας που μπορούν τελικά να αποσταλούν πολλές από τις χρήσιμες πληροφορίες για μια οντότητα από πολλαπλές πηγές κειμένου, χωρίς καμία ανθρώπινη επίβλεψη. Παρουσιάζουμε διάφορες στρατηγικές κατάρτισης που, σε αντίθεση με προηγούμενες προσεγγίσεις, μαθαίνουν να προβλέπουν από κοινού λέξεις και οντότητες στρατηγικές που συγκρίνουμε πειραματικά σε μεταγενέστερες εργασίες στον τομέα τηλεοπτικών ταινιών, όπως η πρόβλεψη ετικετών από σχόλια χρηστών και η αναζήτηση ταινιών φυσικής γλώσσας. Όπως αποδεικνύεται από τα αποτελέσματα, τα μοντέλα μας ταιριάζουν ή ξεπερνούν τις ανταγωνιστικές γραμμές βάσης, μερικές φορές με ελάχιστη ή καθόλου προσαρμογή, και είναι επίσης σε θέση να κλιμακωθούν σε πολύ μεγάλα σώματα. Τέλος, δημοσιοποιούμε τα σύνολα δεδομένων και τα προ-εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα μας. Αυτό περιλαμβάνει τη χαρτογράφηση του σώματος λέξεων ~1Β των κριτικών ταινιών του Amazon (He και McAuley, 2016) σε ετικέτες MovieLens (Harper και Κονστάν, 2016), καθώς και τις προτάσεις ταινιών με ερωτήματα φυσικής γλώσσας και αντίστοιχες συστάσεις της κοινότητας.', 'mk': 'Оваа хартија истражува научување на богати самонадгледувани претставувања на ентитетите од големи количини на поврзан текст. Откако ќе бидат предобучени, овие модели стануваат применливи за повеќето задачи централни на ентитетите, како што се рангирано преземање, комплетирање на базата на знаење, одговори на прашања и повеќе. За разлика од другите методи кои собираат сигнали за самонадгледување базирани само на локален контекст во рамките на реченицата, радикално ја прошируваме идејата за контекст за да вклучиме секој достапен текст поврзан со ентитет. Ова овозможува нова класа на моќни, високи капацитети претставувања кои на крајот можат да дестилираат голем дел од корисните информации за ентитет од повеќе текстови извори, без никаков човечки надзор. Презентираме неколку стратегии за обука кои, за разлика од претходните пристапи, учат заеднички да предвидуваат зборови и ентитети - стратегии кои експериментално ги споредуваме на понатамошните задачи во доменот на ТВ-филмови, како што е предвидувањето на тегите MovieLens од рецензиите на корисниците и пре Како што се докажува од резултатите, нашите модели се совпаѓаат или надминуваат конкурентни основни линии, понекогаш со малку или без финетизирање, и се, исто така, способни да се стегнат до многу голема капора. Конечно, ги обезбедуваме нашите податоци и предобучените модели јавно. This includes Reviews2Movielens, mapping the ~1B word corpus of Amazon movie reviews (He and McAuley, 2016) to MovieLens tags (Harper and Konstan, 2016), as well as Reddit Movie Suggestions with natural language queries and corresponding community recommendations.', 'it': "Questo articolo esplora l'apprendimento di ricche rappresentazioni di entità auto-supervisionate da grandi quantità di testo associato. Una volta pre-addestrati, questi modelli diventano applicabili a più attività incentrate sull'entità come recupero classificato, completamento della base di conoscenza, risposta alle domande e altro ancora. A differenza di altri metodi che raccolgono segnali di auto-supervisione basati semplicemente su un contesto locale all'interno di una frase, espandiamo radicalmente la nozione di contesto per includere qualsiasi testo disponibile relativo a un'entità. Ciò consente una nuova classe di rappresentazioni potenti e ad alta capacità in grado di distillare gran parte delle informazioni utili su un'entità da più fonti di testo, senza alcuna supervisione umana. Presentiamo diverse strategie di formazione che, a differenza degli approcci precedenti, imparano a prevedere congiuntamente parole ed entità - strategie che confrontiamo sperimentalmente sulle attività a valle nel dominio TV-Movies, come la previsione dei tag MovieLens dalle recensioni degli utenti e la ricerca di film in linguaggio naturale. Come evidenziato dai risultati, i nostri modelli corrispondono o superano le linee di base competitive, a volte con poca o nessuna messa a punto, e sono anche in grado di scalare corpora molto grande. Infine, rendiamo pubblici i nostri dataset e modelli pre-addestrati. Questo include Reviews2Movielens, mappando il corpus di parole ~1B di recensioni di film Amazon (He e McAuley, 2016) ai tag MovieLens (Harper e Konstan, 2016), così come Reddit Movie Suggestions con query in linguaggio naturale e corrispondenti raccomandazioni della comunità.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente nagrinėjami daug savarankiškai prižiūrimų subjektų atstovų mokymai iš didelių susijusių tekstų sumų. Iš anksto apmokyti šie modeliai tampa taikomi daugeliui subjektų centrinių užduočių, pavyzdžiui, klasifikuotam atgavimui, žinių bazės užbaigimui, atsakymui į klausimus ir daugiau. Priešingai nei kiti metodai, pagal kuriuos derlius gaunamas savarankiškos priežiūros signalas, pagrįstas tik vietos aplinkybėmis pagal sakinį, radikaliai išplečiame konteksto sąvoką įtraukiant bet kokį turimą tekstą, susijusį su subjektu. Tai leidžia sukurti naują galingų, didelių pajėgumų atstovavimų klasę, kuri galiausiai gali distiliuoti didelę naudingą informaciją apie subjektą iš įvairių tekstų šaltinių be jokios žmogaus priežiūros. Mes pristatome keletą mokymo strategijų, kurios, priešingai nei ankstesni metodai, mokosi bendrai prognozuoti žodžius ir subjektus - strategijas, kurias eksperimentiškai palyginame su tolesnėmis užduotimis televizijos filmų srityje, kaip antai "MovieLens" ženklų prognozė iš naudotojų apžvalgų ir gamtinės kalbos filmų paieškos. Kaip matyti iš rezultatų, mūsų modeliai atitinka arba viršija konkurencines bazines linijas, kartais mažai arba be tobulinimo, ir taip pat gali mastuoti iki labai didelės korporacijos. Galiausiai viešai skelbiame savo duomenų rinkinius ir iš anksto parengtus modelius. Tai apima Reviews2Movielens, žemėlapizuojant ~1B žodžių Amazonos filmų apžvalgas (He ir McAuley, 2016) į MovieLens etiketes (Harper ir Konstan, 2016), taip pat Reddit filmų pasiūlymus su natūraliais kalbų klausimais ir atitinkamomis bendruomenės rekomendacijomis.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз өзіңізге қарағандар үлкен мәтіннің өзіңізге қарағандарын көрсетеді. Бұл үлгілер алдын- ала оқылған кезде, білім негізінің толтыруы, сұрақ жауап беру және көптеген бірнеше бөлік ортасындағы тапсырмалар үшін қолданылады. Өзімізді қарау сигналдарын тек жергілікті контекстіне негізделген басқа әдістерінен айырмашылық, біз контекстің ойымын радикалық түрде кеңейту үшін бір мәтінді бірге қатынау үшін қолданылады. Бұл жаңа күшті, күшті деңгейіндегі таңбалардың класын мүмкіндік береді. Сонымен қайталап, адамдарды қарау жоқ, бірнеше мәтін көзінен бірнеше мәтін көзінен бірнеше мәтін Біз бірнеше бақылау стратегияларын таңдаймыз. Алдыңғы жағдайда сөздерді және бөліктерді біріктіруге үйренеміз - ТВ-Фильм доменіндегі тәжірибелерді тәжірибелерді салыстырып тәжірибелерді, мысалы, пайдаланушыларды Нәтижелерді көрсету үшін, моделдеріміздің көбірек немесе көбірек бағдарламалық негізгі сызықтарымен сәйкес келеді, кейбірде кішкентай немесе жақсы түзетуге болмайды, сондай-ақ олар Соңында, біз деректер жиындарымызды және алдын- ала оқылған үлгілерімізді көп жеткіземіз. Бұл "Reviews2Movielens", Amazon фильм редакцияларының ~1B сөзді корпус (He and McAuley, 2016) MovieLens тегтеріне (Harper and Konstan, 2016), және Reddit фильм табиғи тіл сұрауларының және қатынастық коммуналдық рекомендацияларының түсініктері бар.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സമ്പന്നരായ സ്വയം നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട വസ്തുക്കളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത് വളരെ സമ്പൂര്\u200d മുമ്പ് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരിക്കല്\u200d ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഒരുപാട് സാധാരണ-സെന്റിക്ക് ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രയോജനപ്പെടുന്നു. റാങ്ക് ചെയ്തുകൊണ് Unlike other methods that harvest self-supervision signals based merely on a local context within a sentence, we radically expand the notion of context to include any available text related to an entity.  ഇത് ഒരു പുതിയ ശക്തിയുള്ള, ഉയരത്തിലുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികളെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അവസാനം ഒരു വസ്തുവിനെപ്പറ്റിയുള്ള ഉപയോഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക്  നമ്മള്\u200d കുറച്ചു പരിശീലന നടപടികള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവന്നുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു, മുമ്പുള്ള സമ്പ്രദായങ്ങളും വാക്കുകളും പ്രവചിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. ടിവിയിലെ സിനിമയുട ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് പോലെ, നമ്മുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പൊരുതുന്നുണ്ടോ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d മത്സരിക്കുന്ന അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന് അവസാനം, നമ്മുടെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളും പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലുകളും പ്രസിദ്ധമായി ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നു. ഇതില്\u200d റിവിവിവിയറ്റുകള്\u200d 2ഫിലിയന്\u200dസ് ഉണ്ട്, അമാസോന്\u200d സിനിമ കോര്\u200dപ്പുകളുടെ ~1B വാര്\u200dത്ത് കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് മാപ്പ് ചെയ്യുന്നു. മോവിലെന്\u200dസ് ടാഗുകളിലേക്കും (ഹാര്\u200dപ്പരും കോണ്\u200dസ്റ്റന്\u200d 2016),', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас өөрийгөө удирдаж байгаа баян биетүүдийг маш их хэмжээний харилцааныг судалдаг. Эхлээд сургалтын дараа эдгээр загварууд нь олон төвшин ажил, мэдлэг суурь дуусгах, асуулт хариулт, бас олон зүйлд хэрэглэгддэг. Өөрийгөө удирдлагын сигналуудыг зөвхөн орон нутгийн нөхцөл байдлын тулд зохион байдлын тулд хүргэх бусад арга замын тулд бид бүтээгдэхүүнтэй холбогдсон бүтээгдэхүүний санааг радикал өргөж Энэ нь хүчирхэг, өндөр чадвартай илтгэлийн шинэ хичээл болох бөгөөд эцэст нь хүн төрөлхтний хэрэгтэй мэдээллийг олон текст эх үүсвэрээс ялгаруулж чадна. Бид өмнөх ойлголтын ялгаа хэдэн дасгал хөтөлбөрийн стратегийг илтгэдэг. Өмнөх ойлголтын ялгаатай нь үг болон байгууллагуудыг нийлүүлэхэд суралцаж суралцаж байгаа. ТВ-кино холбооны дасгал дээр туршилтын дасгал ажиллагааг харьцуулдаг стратегийг Үүний үр дүнд тодорхойлсон учраас бидний загвар нь өрсөлдөөний суурь шугам, заримдаа бага эсвэл шаардлагагүй, мөн маш том корпора руу шилжүүлж чадна. Эцэст нь бид өгөгдлийн сангууд болон урд сургалтын загваруудыг олон нийтэд ашиглаж чадна. Энэ нь Reviews2Movielens, Amazon киноны ~1B үгний корпус (He and McAuley, 2016) киноны тегт (Harper and Konstan, 2016), Байгалийн хэлний кверитүүд болон нийгмийн зөвлөгөөтэй Reddit киноны зөвлөгөө.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini mengeksplorasi belajar persembahan entiti yang mengawasi diri yang kaya dari jumlah besar teks berkaitan. Setelah dilatih, model ini menjadi berlaku untuk tugas-pusat-entiti berbilang seperti pemulihan berturut-turut, pelengkapan pangkalan pengetahuan, jawapan soalan, dan lebih. Tidak seperti kaedah lain yang mengumpulkan isyarat pengawasan diri berdasarkan konteks setempat dalam kalimat, kita secara radikal mengembangkan konsep konteks untuk termasuk mana-mana teks tersedia berkaitan dengan entiti. Ini membenarkan kelas baru perwakilan berkuasa tinggi yang dapat menghasilkan sebahagian besar maklumat berguna mengenai entiti dari sumber teks berbilang, tanpa sebarang pengawasan manusia. Kami perkenalkan beberapa strategi latihan yang, tidak seperti pendekatan terdahulu, belajar untuk bersama-sama meramalkan perkataan dan entiti - strategi yang kami bandingkan secara eksperimental pada tugas turun dalam domain TV-Movies, seperti ramalan tag MovieLens dari ulasan pengguna dan carian filem bahasa semulajadi. Seperti yang dibuktikan oleh keputusan, model kita sepadan atau melebihi garis dasar kompetitif, kadang-kadang dengan sedikit atau tiada penyesuaian, dan juga mampu skala ke korpra yang sangat besar. Akhirnya, kami membuat set data dan model terlatih tersedia secara umum. Ini termasuk Reviews2Movielens, memetakan ~1B perkataan corpus bagi ulasan filem Amazon (Dia dan McAuley, 2016) ke tag MovieLens (Harper dan Konstan, 2016), serta cadangan Reddit Movie dengan pertanyaan bahasa biasa dan cadangan komuniti yang sepadan.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jesplora t-tagħlim ta’ rappreżentazzjonijiet rikki ta’ entitajiet awtosorveljati minn ammonti kbar ta’ test assoċjat. Ladarba jitħarrġu minn qabel, dawn il-mudelli jsiru applikabbli għal kompiti ċentriċi multipli bejn l-entitajiet bħall-irkupru kklassifikat, it-tlestija tal-bażi tal-għarfien, it-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet, u aktar. Għall-kuntrarju ta’ metodi oħra li jiġbru sinjali ta’ awtoservizzjoni bbażati sempliċement fuq kuntest lokali fi ħdan sentenza, a ħna qegħdin jespandu radikalment il-kunċett ta’ kuntest biex jinkludi kwalunkwe test disponibbli relatat ma’ entità. Dan jippermetti klassi ġdida ta’ rappreżentazzjonijiet b’kapaċità qawwija u għolja li fl-a ħħar mill-aħħar jistgħu jiddistillaw ħafna mill-informazzjoni utli dwar entità minn sorsi multipli tat-test, mingħajr ebda superviżjoni umana. Aħna nippreżentaw diversi strateġiji ta’ taħriġ li, kuntrarjament għall-approċċi preċedenti, jitgħallmu jipprevedu b’mod konġunt kliem u entitajiet - strateġiji li nqabblu esperimentalment fuq kompiti downstream fid-dominju TV-Movies, bħall-previżjoni tat-tikketta MovieLens minn reviżjonijiet tal-utenti u t-tiftix tal-films b’lingwa naturali Kif jidher mir-riżultati, il-mudelli tagħna jaqblu jew jaqbżu l-linji bażi kompetittivi, xi drabi bi bi ftit jew mingħajr aġġustament fin, u huma kapaċi wkoll jikbru l-iskala għal korpora kbira ħafna. Fl-aħħar nett, nagħmlu s-settijiet tad-dejta u l-mudelli mħarrġa minn qabel disponibbli għall-pubbliku. Dan jinkludi Reviews2Movielens, li jimmappa l-kelma korpus ~1B tar-reviżjonijiet tal-films tal-Amazon (He u McAuley, 2016) għal tikketti tal-MovieLens (Harper u Konstan, 2016), kif ukoll Suġġerimenti tal-Films Reddit b’mistoqsijiet lingwistiċi naturali u rakkomandazzjonijiet komunitarji korrispondenti.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł bada uczenie się bogatych samodzielnie nadzorowanych reprezentacji jednostek z dużych ilości powiązanego tekstu. Po wstępnym przeszkoleniu modele te stają się stosowane do wielu zadań zorientowanych na podmioty, takich jak pozyskiwanie rankingowe, uzupełnianie bazy wiedzy, odpowiadanie na pytania i wiele innych. W przeciwieństwie do innych metod, które zbierają sygnały autonadzoru oparte jedynie na kontekście lokalnym w zdaniu, radykalnie rozszerzamy pojęcie kontekstu o dowolny dostępny tekst związany z jednostką. Umożliwia to stworzenie nowej klasy potężnych reprezentacji o dużej pojemności, które mogą ostatecznie destylować wiele przydatnych informacji o jednostce z wielu źródeł tekstu, bez żadnego nadzoru człowieka. Przedstawiamy kilka strategii szkoleniowych, które, w przeciwieństwie do poprzednich podejść, uczą się wspólnie przewidywać słowa i podmioty. Strategie porównujemy eksperymentalnie na dalszych zadaniach w domenie TV-Movies, takich jak przewidywanie tagów MovieLens z recenzji użytkowników i wyszukiwanie filmów w języku naturalnym. Jak dowodzą wyniki, nasze modele pasują lub przewyższają konkurencyjne linie bazowe, czasami z małym lub brakiem dostrajania, a także są w stanie skalować do bardzo dużych korpusów. Wreszcie udostępniamy publicznie nasze zbiory danych i wstępnie przeszkolone modele. Obejmuje to Reviews2Movielens, mapowanie ~1B korpusu słów recenzji filmów Amazon (He i McAuley, 2016) do tagów MovieLens (Harper i Konstan, 2016), a także sugestie Reddit Movie wraz z zapytaniami języka naturalnego i odpowiednimi zaleceniami społeczności.', 'no': 'Denne papiret utforskar å lære rike selvoversikte entitetsrepresentasjonar frå store mengdar tilknytte tekst. Når dei først trengte, vert desse modelane tilgjengelege for fleire entitetssentrale oppgåver, slik som rankert henting, kunnskapsbasefullføring, spørsmålssvar og meir. I motsetjing til andre metoder som byrjar selvoversiktsignaler basert berre på ein lokal kontekst i eit setning, utvidar vi radikalt noen kontekst for å inkludere alle tilgjengelege tekstar som er relatert til eit entitet. Dette slår på ein ny klasse av kraftige, høg kapasitetsrepresentasjonar som eventuelt kan distillere mykje av den nyttige informasjonen om ein entitet frå fleire tekstkilder, utan nokon menneske oversikt. Vi presenterer fleire opplæringsstrategiar som, i motsetjing av førre tilnærmingar, lærer å forhåndsvisa ord og einingar - strategiar vi samanliknar eksperimentelt på nedstrekke oppgåver i TV-Filmdomenet, slik som forhåndsvising av filmlens frå brukararsøk og naturspråk-søk. Som viste av resultater, målene våre passar eller utfører konkurentære baselinjer, noen ganger med lite eller ingen finnstilling, og kan også skalera til svært stor korpora. I slutt lager vi datasettet våre og først trengte modeller offentlig tilgjengeleg. Dette inkluderer Reviews2Movielens, kartlegging av ~1B ord corpus av Amazon film reviews (He and McAuley, 2016) til filmLens taggar (Harper and Konstan, 2016), og Reddit Film Suggestingar med naturspråkkspørjingar og tilsvarande kommunikasjonsverdiar.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir istražuje učenje bogatih autonadzornih predstavljanja entiteta iz velikih količina povezanih teksta. Kada su predobučeni, ovi modeli postaju primjenjivi na višestruke centralne zadatke kao što su redovni povratak, završetak baze znanja, odgovor na pitanja i više. Za razliku od ostalih metoda koje prikupljaju signale samopouzdanja, zasnovane samo na lokalnom kontekstu unutar rečenice, radikalno proširimo pojam konteksta da uključujemo bilo koji dostupni tekst povezan sa entitetom. To omogućava novu klasu moćnih, visokog kapaciteta predstavljanja koje na kraju mogu destilati većinu korisnih informacija o entiteti iz višestrukih tekstskih izvora, bez ljudskog nadzora. Predstavljamo nekoliko strategija obuke koje, za razliku od prethodnih pristupa, naučimo zajedno predviđati riječi i entitete - strategije koje uspoređujemo eksperimentalno o donjim zadacima u domenu televizora-filmova, poput predviđanja filmova filmova iz pregleda korisnika i pretraživanja prirodnog jezika. Kao što je dokazano rezultatima, naši modeli se poklapaju ili nadmašavaju konkurentne osnovne linije, ponekad sa malim ili bez dobrih prilagođavanja, i takođe su u mogućnosti da se sklonimo na veoma veliku korporu. Konaèno, javno dostavljamo naše podatke i predobučene modele. To uključuje Reviews2Movielens, mapiranje ~1B riječi korpusa Amazonskih filmskih revizija (On i McAuley, 2016) na filmske etikete (Harper i Konstan, 2016), kao i predloge Reddit filma sa prirodnim ispitivanjem jezika i odgovarajućim preporukama zajednice.', 'so': "Warqaddaas wuxuu ka baaraandegaa barashada macluumaadka hodantinimada iskuulka ah oo ka mid ah matxaf badan oo la xiriiray. Markii lagu tababariyey horay, modelladan waxay ku habboon karaan shaqooyin badan oo ay ka mid yihiin dib u soo qaadashada, dhamaystirka aqoonta, jawaabta su'aalaha iyo wax ka badan. Si u duwan qaababka kale oo ay soo goostaan calaamado self-ilaaliya oo kaliya ku saleysan qoraal gudaha, waxaynu si rasmi ah u sii kordhinnaa fikrada hoose si a an ugu qorno qoraal la xiriira qof walbo ah. Taas waxay qaban kartaa fasalka cusub oo xoog badan oo awoodda sare, kaas oo ugu dambaysta u kala sooci kara macluumaad faa’iido leh oo la xiriira bogga macluumaad faa’iido ah oo ku saabsan sourceoyin text ah oo a an ilaalinayn dadka. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qalabka waxbarashada, si u eg qaabab horumar ah, waxan u barta si iskaasha ah wax u sii sheego hadal iyo waxyaabaha- strategiyada aynu u isbarbarbarno hawlaha hoose-dureerada ee gudaha fiidiyeemada, tusaale ahaan wax ka sii sheegi karo fiidiyees iyo raadinta filimada afka dabiiciga ah. As evidenced by results, our models match or outperform competitive baselines, sometimes with little or no fine-tuning, and are also able to scale to very large corpora.  Ugu dambaysta, waxaynu sameynaa sawiradayada iyo modelalka horay loo tababaray si bayaan ah. Taas waxaa ka mid ah Reviews2Movielens, kartonka qoraalka qoraalka ee Amazon movie reviews (He and McAuley, 2016) ee fiidiyees tags (Harper and Konstan, 2016), iyo sidoo kale Suggestions of Reddit Film with queries of natural language and corresponding community recommendations.", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats utforskar inlärning av rika självövervakade entitetsrepresentationer från stora mängder tillhörande text. När dessa modeller har tränats i förväg blir de tillämpliga på flera entitetscentrerade uppgifter som rangordnad hämtning, färdigställande av kunskapsbas, frågesvar med mera. Till skillnad från andra metoder som skördar självövervakningssignaler baserade enbart på ett lokalt sammanhang i en mening, utvidgar vi radikalt begreppet sammanhang till att inkludera all tillgänglig text relaterad till en entitet. Detta möjliggör en ny klass av kraftfulla representationer med hög kapacitet som slutligen kan destillera mycket av den användbara informationen om en entitet från flera textkällor, utan någon mänsklig övervakning. Vi presenterar flera utbildningsstrategier som, till skillnad från tidigare tillvägagångssätt, lär sig att gemensamt förutsäga ord och entiteter - strategier vi jämför experimentellt på nedströms uppgifter inom TV-Movies domänen, såsom MovieLens tagg prediktion från användarrecensioner och naturlig språkfilm sökning. Som framgår av resultaten matchar eller överträffar våra modeller konkurrerande baslinjer, ibland med lite eller ingen finjustering, och kan också skala till mycket stora corpora. Slutligen gör vi våra dataset och förutbildade modeller tillgängliga för allmänheten. Detta inkluderar Reviews2Movielens, kartläggning av ~ 1B ord korpus av Amazon filmrecensioner (He och McAuley, 2016) till MovieLens taggar (Harper och Konstan, 2016), samt Reddit Movie Förslag med naturspråk frågor och motsvarande community rekommendationer.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் பணக்கூடிய தன்னால் கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட செயல்பாடுகளின் பெரிய தொடர்புடைய உரையிலிருந்த முன்பயிற்சியில் ஒருமுறை, இந்த மாதிரிகள் பல பொருள்- சென்டிரிக் பணிகளுக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்படும் போது, ஆரம்பிக்கப்பட்ட மீட்டெடுப்பு,  வாக்கியத்திற்குள் மட்டும் உள்ளூர் சூழ்நிலையில் மட்டும் சேர்த்து செல்லும் மற்ற முறைகளை வேறு முறைகளில் நாம் விரிவாக்குகிறோ இது ஒரு புதிய சக்தியுள்ள, உயர்த்த முக்கிய பிரதிநிதிகளை செயல்படுத்துகிறது, அது இறுதியாக பயனுள்ள தகவல்களை பலவிதமான உரை மூலத்திலிருந்து பி நாங்கள் பல பயிற்சி துறைகளை காண்பிக்கிறோம், முன்னால் அணுகுகளுக்கு முன்னால் சொல்கள் மற்றும் உண்மைகளுக்கு ஒன்றாக முன்னால் கற்றுக் கொள்ள - நாம் சோதனைப்படுத்தும் விர முடிவுகளால் தெளிவாக்கப்பட்டது போல, எங்கள் மாதிரிகள் பொருந்தும் அல்லது போராடும் அடிப்படைகளை வெளியேற்றும், சில நேரங்களில் சிறிய அல் இறுதியில், நாம் எங்கள் தகவல் அமைப்புகள் மற்றும் முன் பயிற்சி மாதிரிகள் பொதுவாக கிடைக்கும். இது ~1B வார்த்தைக் காட்சியை அமாசான் படத்தின் முன்கோப்புகளின் ~1B வார்த்தை குறிப்புகளை வரைபடத்தில் சேர்க்கிறது (அவன் மற்றும் மெக்ஒலி 2016) சில விளக்கச்சீட்டுகளுக்கு (ஹார்', 'ro': 'Această lucrare explorează învățarea unor reprezentări bogate de entități auto-supravegheate din cantități mari de text asociat. Odată pre-instruite, aceste modele devin aplicabile mai multor sarcini centrate pe entitate, cum ar fi recuperarea clasată, completarea bazei de cunoștințe, răspunsul la întrebări și multe altele. Spre deosebire de alte metode care recoltează semnale de auto-supraveghere bazate doar pe un context local într-o propoziție, extindem radical noțiunea de context pentru a include orice text disponibil legat de o entitate. Acest lucru permite o nouă clasă de reprezentări puternice, de mare capacitate, care pot distila în cele din urmă o mare parte din informațiile utile despre o entitate din mai multe surse de text, fără nici o supraveghere umană. Vă prezentăm mai multe strategii de instruire care, spre deosebire de abordările anterioare, învață să prezică împreună cuvinte și entități - strategii pe care le comparăm experimental pe sarcinile din aval din domeniul TV-Filme, cum ar fi predicția etichetelor MovieLens din recenziile utilizatorilor și căutarea filmelor în limbaj natural. După cum demonstrează rezultatele, modelele noastre se potrivesc sau depășesc performanțele de bază competitive, uneori cu puțin sau fără ajustare fină, și sunt, de asemenea, capabile să se scaleze la corpore foarte mari. În cele din urmă, facem publice seturile noastre de date și modelele pre-instruite. Aceasta include Reviews2Movielens, maparea corpului de cuvinte ~1B de recenzii de filme Amazon (He și McAuley, 2016) la etichetele MovieLens (Harper și Konstan, 2016), precum și sugestii Reddit Movie cu interogări de limbaj natural și recomandări corespunzătoare comunității.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ مطالعہ کرتا ہے کہ بہت سی مقدار متصل کے متصل کی تعلیمات کے ذریعے ثروت کی نظارت رکھی ہوئی ایٹنی کی تعلیمات سکھائی جاتی ہے. Once pre-trained, these models become applicable to multiple entities-centric tasks such as ranked retrieval, knowledge base completion, question response, and more. اور دوسرے طریقے کے مطابق جو خود-نظارت سیگنالوں کو صرف ایک جماعت کے اندر محلی سیگنالوں پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں، ہم نے سیگنالوں کی نظریہ بالکل پھیلایا ہے کہ کسی ایستی کے ساتھ کوئی موجود متن شامل کریں۔ یہ ایک نئی کلاس کی قدرت والی، بلند قابلیت کی نمایش کرتا ہے جو بالاخره بہت سے فائدہ دار معلومات کو ایک ایستی کے بارے میں مختلف متن سورجوں سے جدا کر سکتا ہے، کسی انسان کی نظر کے بغیر۔ ہم نے بہت سی تدریس استراتژی پیش کیے ہیں جو پہلے کی تقریبا کے بغیر، کلمات اور اختیارات کے ساتھ ایک دوسرے سے پیش کیے جاتے ہیں - استراتژی جنہیں ہم ٹی وی فلم دامین میں نیچے سیارے کے کاموں کے بارے میں تدریج کرتے ہیں، جیسے فیل لینز ٹاگ پیش کیے جاتے ہیں، کارساز رسانیو نتائج کے ذریعے دکھائے گئے ہیں، ہمارے نمونے مطابق یا زیادہ مسابقه کی بنسٹلین، کبھی بہت کم یا کوئی اچھی تنظیم کے ذریعے، اور بہت بڑی کورورا تک استعمال کر سکتے ہیں. آخر میں ہم اپنے ڈاٹ سٹ اور پیش ترسین کی مدل کو ظاہر طور پر موجود بناتے ہیں۔ اس میں Reviews2Movielens شامل ہوتا ہے ~1B word corpus of Amazon film reviews (He and McAuley, 2016) to MovieLens tags (Harper and Konstan, 2016), as well as Reddit Movie Suggestions with natural language queries and corresponding community recommendations.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ සම්බන්ධ පාළුවන්ගේ ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් සම්බන්ධ පාළුවන්ගේ සම්බන්ධ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහ ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු වෙලාවට, මේ මොඩේල් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්න අනිත් විධානයක් වෙනුවෙන් ස්වාම්ප්\u200dරධාන සංඥාවක් පරික්ෂා කරනවා වාක්ෂාවක් ඇතුලේ ස්ථානික සංඥාවක් විතරයි, අපි ස මේක ශක්තිමත්, උත්සක්ෂමතාවක් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් සක්\u200dරිය කරනවා ඒක අන්තිමේදී ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් වගේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ගැන විශ අපි පුහුණුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ මුලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්, වචනය සහ භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න බැරි විදිහට, අපි ප ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් පිළිබඳු විදිහට, අපේ මෝඩේල් එක්ක සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් නැති ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් සම්පූර්ණ අන්තිමේදී, අපි අපේ දත්ත සේට් සහ ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරසිද්ධියක් ලොකු විදියට. This comprises Reviews2Picturelens, map the ~1B word Corpus of Amazone චිත්\u200dරපට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් (ඔහු සහ McAuley, 2016) to PictureLens Tags (Harper and Konstan, 2016), as well as Rededit චිත්\u200dරපට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් (ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්) and conflicting', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz bogʻliq matnning katta ko'plab o'xshash quyidagi taʼminlovchilarni o'rganishni o'rganadi. Bir marta o'rganishdan oldin, bu modellar tashkilotlardan bir nechta narsalar qo'llangan narsalar, tashqi asosiy tuzuvchi, savol javob beradi va yana bir nechta narsalar bo'ladi. Name Bu bir nechta matn manbalardan bir nechta matn manbalardan foydalanuvchi maʼlumotni ajratish mumkin. Bu bir nechta qo'shimcha qo'shimcha qo'llanmalarni qo'shish mumkin. Biz bir necha ta'lim strategiyani hozir qilamiz, bir necha taklif qiladigan so'zlar va suhbatlarni birlashtirishni o'rganamiz - tashkilotlarni tasavvur qilishda o'rganish strategiyalar, masalan, foydalanuvchilar tashqarini va tabiiy tillar qidirishdan foydalanuvchi va tabiiy filamu qidirishdan tasavvur qilamiz. Natijalarni ko'rsatganda, modellarimiz o'xshash yoki rivojlanadigan asboblarni bajaradi, ba'zida kichkina yoki yaxshi yo'q, va yana juda katta kompaniyalarni ko'paya oladi. Oxirgi, biz maʼlumotlar saqlarimiz va o'rganishdan oldin modellar natijasida mavjud. Name", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này tìm hiểu các đơn vị tự giám sát giàu có từ một lượng lớn văn bản tương ứng. Một khi được huấn luyện trước, các mô hình này sẽ được áp dụng cho các công việc quy mô khác nhau như việc lấy hạng, hoàn thành căn cứ kiến thức, trả lời câu hỏi, và nhiều hơn nữa. Không giống những phương pháp khác thu hoạch tín hiệu tự giám sát dựa trên một trường hợp trong một câu, chúng tôi hoàn to àn mở rộng khái niệm ngữ cảnh để bao gồm mọi văn bản có liên quan đến một thực thể. Điều này cho phép một nhóm các biểu tượng mạnh mẽ, khả năng cao có thể tạo ra nhiều thông tin hữu ích về một thực thể từ nhiều nguồn văn bản, mà không bị giám sát bởi con người. Chúng tôi đưa ra nhiều chiến lược huấn luyện mà, không giống các phương pháp trước, chúng tôi cùng dự đoán các từ và thực thể - chiến thuật chúng tôi so sánh thí nghiệm về các công việc xuôi dòng trong lĩnh vực phim truyền hình, như dự đoán thẻ Movie Lens từ bình người dùng và tìm kiếm bộ phim ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Như kết quả chứng minh, các mẫu của chúng ta khớp hoặc hoàn thiện bản lề cạnh tranh, đôi khi không có chút hay không có độ trừng, và cũng có thể xếp hạng rất lớn. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi công khai các tập tin và mẫu được đào tạo. Trong đó có Revewsz2Movie lens, bản đồ hình ảnh từ "1B" của các buổi xem phim Amazon (Ông và Mculey, thậm chí là file bây giờ) đến các thẻ xem phim Movie (Harper và Konstan, thậm chí là bộ phim Reddit suggestions với các câu hỏi ngôn ngữ tự nhiên và các lời khuyên cộng đồng tương ứng.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir istražuje učenje bogatih autonadzornih predstavljanja entiteta iz velikih količina povezanih teksta. Nakon predobučenog, ovi modeli postaju primjenjivi na višestruke centralne zadatke kao što su redovni povratak, završenje baze znanja, odgovor na pitanja i više. Za razliku od ostalih metoda koje prikupljaju signale samopouzdanja temeljno na lokalnom kontekstu unutar rečenice, radikalno proširimo pojam konteksta kako bi uključili bilo koji dostupni tekst povezan s entitetom. To omogućava novu klasu moćnih, visokog kapaciteta predstavljanja koje na kraju mogu destilati mnogo korisnih informacija o entitetu iz višestrukih tekstskih izvora, bez bilo kojeg ljudskog nadzora. Predstavljamo nekoliko strategija obuke koje, za razliku od prethodnih pristupa, naučimo zajedno predviđati riječi i entitete - strategije koje uspoređujemo eksperimentalno o donjim zadatkima u domenu TV-Filma, poput predviđanja filmova oznake od preglede korisnika i pretraživanja prirodnog jezika. Kao što je dokazano rezultatima, naši modeli se uklapaju ili nadmađuju konkurentne osnovne linije, ponekad sa malo ili bez dobrog prilagođenja, i također su u stanju mjeriti na veoma veliku korporu. Napokon, javno dostavljamo naše podatke i predobučene modele. To uključuje Reviews2Movielens, mapiranje ~1B riječi korpusa Amazon filmskih revizija (On i McAuley, 2016) na filmske etikete (Harper i Konstan, 2016), kao i predloge Reddit filma s prirodnim ispitivanjem jezika i odgovarajućim preporukama zajednice.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel onderzoekt het leren van rijke zelfbegeleide entiteitsrepresentaties van grote hoeveelheden bijbehorende tekst. Eenmaal vooraf getraind, worden deze modellen toepasbaar op meerdere entiteitsgerichte taken, zoals gerangschikt ophalen, kennisbank voltooien, vragen beantwoorden en meer. In tegenstelling tot andere methoden die zelftoezichtssignalen oogsten op basis van louter een lokale context binnen een zin, breiden we het begrip context radicaal uit tot elke beschikbare tekst gerelateerd aan een entiteit. Dit maakt een nieuwe klasse van krachtige representaties met hoge capaciteit mogelijk die uiteindelijk veel nuttige informatie over een entiteit uit meerdere tekstbronnen kunnen distilleren, zonder enig menselijk toezicht. We presenteren verschillende trainingsstrategieën die, in tegenstelling tot eerdere benaderingen, leren om gezamenlijk woorden en entiteiten te voorspellen. Zoals blijkt uit de resultaten, voldoen onze modellen aan of overtreffen concurrerende baselines, soms met weinig of geen fine-tuning, en zijn ook in staat om te schalen naar zeer grote corpora. Tot slot maken we onze datasets en voorgetrainde modellen openbaar. Dit omvat Reviews2Movielens, het toewijzen van het ~1B woordcorpus van Amazon-filmrecensies (He en McAuley, 2016) aan MovieLens-tags (Harper en Konstann, 2016), evenals Reddit-filmsuggesties met vragen in natuurlijke taal en bijbehorende aanbevelingen van de gemeenschap.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag untersucht lernfﾃ､hige selbstﾃｼberwachte Entitﾃ､tsreprﾃ､sentationen aus groﾃ歹n Mengen zugehﾃｶrigen Texten. Einmal vortrainiert, kﾃｶnnen diese Modelle fﾃｼr mehrere entitﾃ､tszentrierte Aufgaben wie Ranglisten-Abruf, Wissensdatenbank-Vervollstﾃ､ndigung, Fragebeantwortung und mehr angewendet werden. Im Gegensatz zu anderen Methoden, die Selbstﾃｼberwachungssignale sammeln, die lediglich auf einem lokalen Kontext innerhalb eines Satzes basieren, erweitern wir den Begriff Kontext radikal um jeden verfﾃｼgbaren Text, der sich auf eine Entitﾃ､t bezieht. Dies ermﾃｶglicht eine neue Klasse leistungsstarker Reprﾃ､sentationen mit hoher Kapazitﾃ､t, die letztendlich viele der nﾃｼtzlichen Informationen ﾃｼber eine Entitﾃ､t aus mehreren Textquellen destillieren kﾃｶnnen, ohne menschliche Aufsicht. Wir stellen verschiedene Trainingsstrategien vor, die im Gegensatz zu frﾃｼheren Ansﾃ､tzen lernen, Wﾃｶrter und Entitﾃ､ten gemeinsam vorherzusagen. Strategien, die wir experimentell auf nachgelagerten Aufgaben im TV-Movie-Bereich vergleichen, wie z.B. MovieLens Tag Vorhersage aus Benutzerrezensionen und natﾃｼrlich sprachliche Filmsuche. Wie die Ergebnisse belegen, entsprechen oder ﾃｼbertreffen unsere Modelle wettbewerbsfﾃ､hige Baselines, manchmal mit wenig oder gar keiner Feinabstimmung, und sind auch in der Lage, sehr groﾃ歹 Korpora zu skalieren. Schlieﾃ殕ich stellen wir unsere Datensﾃ､tze und vortrainierten Modelle ﾃｶffentlich zur Verfﾃｼgung. Dazu gehﾃｶren Reviews2Movielens, Mapping des ~1B Wortkorpus von Amazon Filmrezensionen (He und McAuley, 2016) auf MovieLens-Tags (Harper und Konstan, 2016) sowie Reddit Movie Suggestions mit Anfragen in natﾃｼrlicher Sprache und entsprechenden Community-Empfehlungen.', 'da': 'Dette papir undersøger at lære rige selvovervågede enhedsrepræsentationer fra store mængder tilknyttet tekst. Når disse modeller er først uddannede, bliver de anvendelige til flere enhedscentrerede opgaver som rangeret hentning, vidensbaseret færdiggørelse, spørgsmål besvarelse og meget mere. I modsætning til andre metoder, der høster selvovervågningssignaler baseret udelukkende på en lokal kontekst i en sætning, udvider vi radikalt begrebet kontekst til at omfatte enhver tilgængelig tekst relateret til en enhed. Dette muliggør en ny klasse af kraftfulde, høj kapacitet repræsentationer, der i sidste ende kan destillere meget af de nyttige oplysninger om en enhed fra flere tekstkilder, uden noget menneskeligt tilsyn. Vi præsenterer flere træningsstrategier, der i modsætning til tidligere tilgange lærer at forudsige ord og enheder i fællesskab - strategier vi sammenligner eksperimentelt om downstream opgaver i tv-film domænet, såsom MovieLens tagforudsigelse fra brugeranmeldelser og naturlig sprogfilmsøgning. Som det fremgår af resultaterne, matcher eller overgår vores modeller konkurrencedygtige basislinjer, nogle gange med lidt eller ingen finjustering, og er også i stand til at skalere til meget store corpora. Endelig gør vi vores datasæt og prætrænede modeller offentligt tilgængelige. Dette omfatter Reviews2Movielens, kortlægning af ~1B ord korpus af Amazon-filmanmeldelser (He og McAuley, 2016) til MovieLens tags (Harper og Konstan, 2016), samt Reddit Movie Forslag med naturlige sprogforespørgsler og tilsvarende fællesskabsanbefalinger.', 'ko': '본고는 대량의 관련 텍스트에서 풍부한 자체 감독 실체 표시를 배웠다.사전 교육을 받은 후 이러한 모델은 등급별 검색, 지식 라이브러리 완성, 문제 응답 등 실체 중심의 여러 가지 임무에 적용될 것이다.문장 중의 국부적인 언어 환경만 바탕으로 자기 감독 신호를 얻는 다른 방법과 달리 우리는 언어 환경의 개념을 근본적으로 확장하고 실체와 관련된 모든 사용 가능한 텍스트를 포함한다.이로써 새로운 강력하고 고용량 표시가 가능하게 되었고, 최종적으로 여러 텍스트 원본에서 실체와 관련된 많은 유용한 정보를 추출할 수 있으며, 누구의 감독도 필요 없다.우리는 몇 가지 훈련 전략을 제시했다. 이전의 방법과 달리 이러한 전략 학습은 단어와 실체를 연합하여 예측하는 것이다. 우리는 텔레비전 영화 분야의 하위 임무에서 사용자 평론과 자연 언어 영화 검색에서 무비린스 라벨을 예측하는 것을 실험적으로 비교했다.결과에 따르면 우리의 모델은 경쟁 기선에 부합되거나 우수하며 때로는 미세한 조정이 거의 없고 매우 큰 어료 라이브러리로 확장될 수도 있다.마지막으로 우리는 우리의 데이터 집합과 사전 훈련 모델을 공개할 것이다.리뷰스2 무비렌스, 아마존 영화 리뷰를 위한 ~1B 단어 자료 라이브러리(He와 McAuley, 2016)를 무비렌스 라벨(Harper와 Konstan, 2016)에 비추는 것, 자연 언어 조회와 해당 커뮤니티에서 추천하는 Reddit 영화 조언이 담겨 있다.', 'bg': 'Тази статия изследва изучаването на богати самостоятелно контролирани представи на субекти от големи количества свързан текст. След предварително обучени, тези модели стават приложими за множество задачи, насочени към субектите, като например извличане на ранг, завършване на базата от знания, отговаряне на въпроси и др. За разлика от други методи, които събират сигнали за самоконтрол, базирани само на локален контекст в рамките на изречение, ние радикално разширяваме понятието за контекст, за да включим всеки наличен текст, свързан с дадено същество. Това позволява нов клас мощни, висококапацитетни представяния, които в крайна сметка могат да дестилират голяма част от полезната информация за дадено същество от множество текстови източници, без никакво човешко наблюдение. Представяме няколко стратегии за обучение, които, за разлика от предишните подходи, се научават да предсказват съвместно думи и същности - стратегии, които сравняваме експериментално при задачи надолу по веригата в домейна ТВ-филми, като например прогнозиране на маркери от потребителски отзиви и търсене на филми с естествен език. Както се вижда от резултатите, нашите модели съвпадат или превъзхождат конкурентните базови линии, понякога с малко или никакво фино настройване, и също така са в състояние да се мащабират до много големи корпуси. И накрая, ние правим нашите набори от данни и предварително обучени модели публично достъпни. Това включва картографиране на текстовия корпус ~1Б от филмовите ревюта на Амазонка (Той и Маколи, 2016) към таговете на както и предложения за филми с заявки за естествен език и съответните препоръки на общността.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ تحقیق می\u200cکند که یاد گرفتن نمایش\u200cهای شرکت خودکنترل پولدار از مقدار بزرگ متن ارتباط دارد. وقتی پیش آموزش داده شد، این مدلها برای کار های متعدد مرکزی و متعدد، مثل بازیابی درجه، کامل پایگاه دانش، جواب سوال و بیشتری موجود می شوند. برخلاف روش\u200cهای دیگر که سیگنال\u200cهای خود را بر روی یک محیط محلی در یک جمله می\u200cگیرند، ما به طور کاملاً نظر محیط را گسترش می\u200cدهیم تا هر متن موجود در ارتباط با یک entity شامل باشد. این اجازه می دهد کلاس جدید از نمایش\u200cهای قدرتمند و توانایی بالا که بالاخره می\u200cتواند بسیاری از اطلاعات مفید در مورد یک شرکت از منبع متن چندین، بدون هیچ نظارت انسانی را جدا کند. ما استراتژی\u200cهای آموزش چندین را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که در مقابل نزدیک پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای پیش\u200cبینی کلمات و عنوان\u200cها یاد می\u200cگیریم - استراتژی\u200cهایی که در عملیات پایین\u200cپایین\u200cپایین در دومین تلویزیون-فیلم\u200cها در مقایسه می\u200cکنیم، مانند پیشنهاد برنامه\u200cهای فیلم\u200c همانطور که توسط نتایج نشان داده شده، مدل های ما به پایگاه های مسابقه یا پایگاه های مسابقه برخورد می کنند، بعضی وقتها با کمی یا بدون تنظیمات خوب و قادر به مقیاس بسیار بزرگ هستند. بالاخره، ما مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها و مدل\u200cهای پیش آموزش را به طور عمومی در دسترسی می\u200cدهیم. این شامل Reviews2Movielens است که ~1B word corpus of Amazon film reviews (He and McAuley, 2016) به نقشه\u200cهای MovieLens (Harper and Konstan, 2016) و پیشنهاد فیلم Reddit با سوال\u200cهای زبان طبیعی و پیشنهاد\u200cهای جامعه\u200cای مشترک است.', 'af': "Hierdie papier ondersoek die leer van ryk self-ondersoekte entiteit voorstellings van groot hoeveelheid geassosieerde teks. Wanneer voorafgeleer word, word hierdie modele toewenbaar vir veelvuldige entiteite-sentrale taak soos rangeerde herhaal, kennis basis voltooiing, vraag antwoord en meer. Ongelyks van ander metodes wat self-supervisie signale oes wat net op 'n plaaslike konteks binne 'n seting gebaseer is, het ons radikal die nodiging van konteks uitbrei om enige beskikbaar teks met 'n entiteit te insluit. Hierdie aktiveer 'n nuwe klas van kragtige, hoë-kapasiteit-voorstellings wat in einde van die gebruiklike inligting oor 'n entiteit van veelvuldige teksbronne kan distiller sonder enige menslike onderskou. Ons stel verskeie oefening strategies wat, ongelukkig van vooraf toegang, leer om woorde en entiteite saamstig te voorskou - strategies wat ons eksperimenteel vergelyk op onderstreem opdragte in die TV-Film domein, soos MovieLens-etiket voorskou van gebruikerresensies en natuurlike taalsfilm soektog. Soos gewys deur resultate, is ons modele ooreenkomstig of uitgevoer samekomstige basisline, soms met klein of geen fyn-tuning, en is ook in staat om te skaal na baie groot korpora. Eindelik maak ons datastelle en vooraf-opgelei modele openlik beskikbaar. Hierdie insluit Reviews2Movielens, die ~1B woord corpus van Amazon film reviews (Hy en McAuley, 2016) na MovieLens etikette (Harper en Konstan, 2016), en Reddit Film voorstellings met natuurlike taal navraag en ooreenstemmende gemeenskapsaanbeveelinge.", 'id': 'This paper explores learning rich self-supervised entity representations from large amounts of associated text.  Once pre-trained, these models become applicable to multiple entity-centric tasks such as ranked retrieval, knowledge base completion, question answering, and more.  Tidak seperti metode lain yang mengumpulkan sinyal pengawasan diri berdasarkan hanya konteks lokal dalam kalimat, kita radikal memperluas konsep konteks untuk memasukkan semua teks tersedia berkaitan dengan sebuah entitas. This enables a new class of powerful, high-capacity representations that can ultimately distill much of the useful information about an entity from multiple text sources, without any human supervision.  Kami mempersembahkan beberapa strategi pelatihan yang, tidak seperti pendekatan sebelumnya, belajar untuk bersama-sama memprediksi kata-kata dan entitas - strategi kami membandingkan secara eksperimental pada tugas turun di daerah TV-Films, seperti prediksi label MovieLens dari penelitian pengguna dan pencarian film bahasa alami. As evidenced by results, our models match or outperform competitive baselines, sometimes with little or no fine-tuning, and are also able to scale to very large corpora.  Akhirnya, kami membuat dataset kami dan model pre-terlatih tersedia publik. This includes Reviews2Movielens, mapping the ~1B word corpus of Amazon movie reviews (He and McAuley, 2016) to MovieLens tags (Harper and Konstan, 2016), as well as Reddit Movie Suggestions with natural language queries and corresponding community recommendations.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument eksploron mësimin e përfaqësimeve të pasura të njësive të mbikqyrura nga sasi të mëdha teksti i lidhur. Pasi të trajnohen para, këto modele bëhen të aplikueshëm për detyra të shumta qendrore njësisë, të tilla si marrja e renditur, kompletimi i bazës së njohurive, përgjigja e pyetjeve dhe më shumë. Në ndryshim nga metodat e tjera që mbledhin sinjalet e vetë-mbikqyrjes bazuar thjesht në një kontekst lokal brenda një fjalie, ne zgjerojmë radikalisht konceptin e kontekstit për të përfshirë çdo tekst të disponueshëm lidhur me një njësi. Kjo mundëson një klasë të re përfaqësimesh të fuqishme dhe të kapacitetit të lartë që mund të distilojnë më së fundi shumë nga informacionet e dobishme rreth një njësie nga burime të shumta teksti, pa ndonjë mbikqyrje njerëzore. Ne paraqesim disa strategji stërvitjeje që, ndryshe nga qasjet e mëparshme, mësojnë të parashikojnë së bashku fjalë dhe njësi - strategji ne krahasojmë eksperimentalisht me detyra poshtë rrjedhës në domenin e TV-Filmave, të tilla si parashikimi i etiketës MovieLens nga kritikat e përdoruesve dhe kërkimi natyror i filmave në gjuhë. Siç është provuar nga rezultatet, modelet tona përputhen apo tejkalojnë linjat e bazës konkurruese, ndonjëherë me pak apo pa rregullim të hollë, dhe janë gjithashtu në gjendje të shkallojnë në një korpër shumë të madhe. Më në fund, ne i bëjmë të dhënat tona dhe modelet e paratrajnuar publikisht në dispozicion. Kjo përfshin Reviews2Movielens, hartimin e ~1B fjalëve corpus të revisioneve të filmit Amazon (Ai dhe McAuley, 2016) në etiketat MovieLens (Harper dhe Konstan, 2016), si dhe sugjerimet e Reddit Movie me pyetje të gjuhës natyrore dhe rekomandime bashkëkombëtare.', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም ባለጠጋ ራሳቸውን የተጠበቀው አካባቢዎችን በተለያዩ ጽሑፎች ላይ መማር ይፈልጋል፡፡ ከዚህ በፊት ተማሪ በተደረገ ጊዜ እነዚህ ምሳሌዎች እንደተጨማሪው ስራ፣ እውቀት መደምደሚያ፣ ጥያቄ መልስ እና አብዛኛዎችን ለመጠየቅ ይደረጋሉ፡፡ በክፍለ ውጤት ውስጥ የተገኘውን ጽሑፍ ማቀናቀል የተገኘውን ጽሑፍ ማቀናቀል እናስከትላለን፡፡ ይህ አዲስ የኃይለኛና ከፍተኛ ኃይለኛ ተሟጋቾችን ያስችላል፤ ይህ አካባቢ አካሄዱን ከብዙ ጽሑፍ ምንጮች፣ ከሰው ጉዳይ ሳይኖር በብዙ የጥቅም መረጃዎችን ሊለይ ይችላል፡፡ ብዙ ተማሪ strategies እናቀርባለን፣ አስቀድሞ መግለጫ፣ ቃሎችን እና አካባቢዎችን ለመቀበል እና ትምህርት እና ትምህርት - strategies - ከውኃው ውኃ ማድረጊያዎች በታች በሚፈተናው ስርዓት ላይ እናስተያየዋለን፡፡ ፍሬዎቹ እንደሚታወቁ፣ ሞዴላዎቻችን የሚቃወሙ ወይም የሚቃወሙ መሠረቶች፣ አንዳንድ ጊዜ ትንሽ ወይም ጥሩ ሳይኖሩ እናም ወደ ትልቁ ኮርፖርት መቆጣጠርን ይችላሉ፡፡ በመጨረሻም የዳታ ሰርተቶችን እና የቀድሞው ሞዴላዎችን በግልጽ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ይህ የፊልዮችን 2ፊሊኖችን እና የአማዞን የፊልጶን ቃላት ካርፓስ (እርሱ እና ማክAuley, 2016) ወደ ፊልሌኖስ ምልክቶች (ሐርፕር እና ኮንስታን 2016) እና ቀዳሚ ፊልዮ ጥያቄዎችን እና ለባሕላዊ ቋንቋ ጥያቄዎች እና አስተያየት የማኅበራዊ ዝርዝሮች የሚያስታወቂውን ቀዳሚ ጥያቄዎች ይጨምርበታል፡፡', 'az': 'Bu kağıt öz-özünə tərəf yönəlmiş mövzuların böyük nümunələrindən öyrənməsini keşfetir. Əvvəlcə təhsil edildikdən sonra, bu modellər dərəcəli alınma, bilgi bazı tamamlama, sual cavab vermək və daha çox işlərə uyğunlaşdırılar. Öz gözləmə sinyallərini yalnızca bir cümlənin içində yerli bir məlumatın üstündə alan başqa metodların istifadəsində, məlumatların məlumatını yerli bir məlumatın içində genişləyirik. Bu yeni qüvvətli, yüksək qabiliyyət göstəricilərini fəallaşdırır ki, nihayət, insan gözləmədən çox faydalı bir məlumat haqqında çoxluğunu çoxlu məlumatlardan ayıra bilər. Biz bir neçə təhsil stratejisini göstəririk ki, əvvəlki təhsil kimi, sözləri və təhsil işləri birlikdə təhsil etməyi öyrənmirik - televizyon-filmlərin domeinindəki təhsil işləri kimi, MovieLens etiketlərinin təhsil edilməsini və təbiətli dil filmlərin araştırmasından təhsil edirik. Sonuçlarımızın göstərilməsi kimi, modellərimiz münafiqli baz çətinləri ilə uyğunlaşdırır, bəzən kiçik və yaxşı fikirləşdirilməsiz və həmçinin çox böyük korpora sahib olarlar. Sonunda verilən qurğularımızı və əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş modelləri halda faydalandırırıq. Bu Reviews2Movielens, Amazon film reviews (He and McAuley, 2016) filmLens tags (Harper and Konstan, 2016) ilə ~1B word corpus of Amazon film reviews (He and McAuley), as well as Reddit Film Suggestions with natural language queries and corresponding community recommendations.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inagundua kujifunza vifaa vinavyojitegemea tajiri kutoka idadi kubwa ya maandishi yanayohusiana. Mara baada ya mafunzo ya awali, mifano hii inaweza kutumika kufanya kazi nyingi za vituo vingi kama vile upatikanaji mkubwa, ukomo wa msingi wa maarifa, majibu ya maswali, na zaidi. Tofauti na mbinu nyingine ambazo huvuna ishara za kudhibiti kujitegemea pekee kwa muktadha wa mahali ndani ya hukumu, tunapandisha wazo la muktadha ili kuingiza maandishi yoyote yanayohusiana na entity. Hii inawezesha kuwawakilisha darasa mpya yenye nguvu na uwezo mkubwa ambalo kwa mwisho unaweza kufafanua taarifa nyingi za manufaa kuhusu entity kutoka vyanzo vingi vya maandishi kadhaa, bila kufuatiliwa na binadamu. Tunaweza kuweka mikakati kadhaa ya mafunzo ambayo, tofauti na mbinu za kabla, jifunza kutabiri maneno na vifaa - mikakati tunayofananisha kwa uzoefu katika kazi za mito ya chini ya mitandao katika maeneo ya filamu, kama vile utabiri wa Kifilamu kutoka kwa mtazamo wa watumiaji na utafutaji wa filamu za asili. Kama ilivyoonyeshwa na matokeo, mifano yetu inacheza au kutoa misingi ya mashindano ya kushindana, wakati mwingine kwa mabadiliko madogo au yasiyo na mafanikio, na pia wanaweza kupanda makampuni makubwa. Mwisho, tunatengeneza seti zetu za taarifa na mifano ya zamani zilizofunzwa zinapatikana hadharani. Hii inajumuisha Reviews 2Movie, kuchora makampuni ya maneno ya Amazon ya utafiti wa filamu ya ~1B (Yeye na McAuley, 2016) kwa viungo vya Kifilamu (Harper na Konstan, 2016), pamoja na Mapendekezo ya Filamu ya Reddit yenye maswali ya lugha asili na mapendekezo yanayofanana na jamii.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটি সমৃদ্ধ নিজেকে পর্যবেক্ষণ করা বস্তুর প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখতে পাচ্ছে বিশাল পরিমাণ লেখা থেকে। প্রশিক্ষণের পূর্বে একবার, এই মডেলগুলো অনেক সেন্ট্রিক কেন্দ্রীয় কাজের জন্য প্রয়োজনীয় হয়ে যায়, যেমন রেঞ্চ পুনরুদ্ধার, জ্ঞানের ভে Unlike other methods that harvest self-supervision signals based merely on a local context within a sentence, we radically expand the notion of context to include any available text related to an entity.  এটি একটি নতুন শক্তিশালী ও উচ্চ ক্ষমতার প্রতিনিধিত্ব সক্রিয় করে দিয়েছে যা অবশেষে কোন মানুষ পর্যবেক্ষণ ছাড়া অনেক কার্যকর তথ্য বিভাগ করতে পারে। আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি প্রশিক্ষণ কৌশল উপস্থাপন করেছি যার পূর্বের ক্ষেত্রেও, ব্যবহারকারীর পরিদর্শন এবং প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা চলচ্চিত্র অনুসন্ধান থেকে ব্যবহারকারীদের প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রতি  ফলাফলের দ্বারা প্রমাণিত হয়েছে, আমাদের মডেল খেলা অথবা প্রতিযোগিতার বেসাইনের মাধ্যমে প্রতিযোগিতা করে, মাঝে মাঝে মাঝে মাঝে মাঝে ছোট বা কো অবশেষে, আমরা আমাদের ডাটাসেট এবং পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত মডেল প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যাচ্ছি। This includes Reviews2Movielens, mapping the ~1B word corpus of Amazon movie reviews (He and McAuley, 2016) to MovieLens tags (Harper and Konstan, 2016), as well as Reddit Movie Suggestions with natural language queries and corresponding community recommendations.', 'hy': 'This paper explores learning rich self-supervised entity representations from large amounts of associated text.  Երբ նախապատրաստված են, այս մոդելները կիրառվում են առանձին առանձին կենտրոնական խնդիրների համար, ինչպիսիք են դասակարգված վերադարձումը, գիտելիքի հիմքի ավարտումը, հարցերի պատասխանը և այլն: Unlike other methods that harvest self-supervision signals based merely on a local context within a sentence, we radically expand the notion of context to include any available text related to an entity.  Սա հնարավորություն է տալիս նոր հզոր, բարձր կարողությունների ներկայացումների դասարան, որը վերջապես կարող է տարբերակել մի էության մասին օգտակար տեղեկատվությունը բազմաթիվ տեքստի աղբյուրներից առանց որևէ մարդկային վերահսկողության: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի քանի ուսումնասիրության ռազմավարություններ, որոնք, ի տարբերություն նախորդ մոտեցումներին, սովորում են միասին կանխատեսել բառեր և էակներ, ռազմավարություններ, որոնք մենք փորձարկումներով համեմատում ենք հեռուստատեսության ֆիլմերի ոլորտում ներքևի գործողությունների վրա, ինչպիսիք են Ինչպես արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, մեր մոդելները համապատասխանում են կամ գերազանցում են մրցակցության հիմնական գծերը, երբեմն փոքր-ինչ կամ առանց փոքր-ինչ հարմարեցման, և նաև կարող են մեծացնել մինչև շատ մեծ կոպորա: Վերջապես, մենք հանրային հասանելի ենք դարձնում մեր տվյալների համակարգերը և նախապատրաստված մոդելները: This includes Reviews2Movielens, mapping the ~1B word corpus of Amazon movie reviews (He and McAuley, 2016) to MovieLens tags (Harper and Konstan, 2016), as well as Reddit Movie Suggestions with natural language queries and corresponding community recommendations.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz baý özine gözleýän guramlary uly bir metin töwesini keşfetýär. Öňki bilim sisteminden soňra bu nusgalar birnäçe taýýarlar-merkez zada ýaly derejä almak, bilgi tabany tamamlamak, soragy jogaplamak we kän zada uygulandyrylýar. Öz namaýyş signallerini diňe ýerleri bir sözlem içinde daýan etýän başga yönlerden ýaly, biz özümizi namaýyş signallerini birzat bilen meňzeşli metinleri dahil etmek üçin düýbürdik. Bu güýçli, ýokary ukyplyň täze bir synpy üýtgedip, iň soňunda bir adam üstünde nähili maslahat bolmadyk bir zat hakynda faydaly maglumatlary birnäçe metin çeşmedenden ayıracak bolýar. Biz öňki golaýlaryň ýaly soňra sözleri we guramlary öwrenmegi öwrenýän birnäçe okuw stratejiklerini telewizor-filmlerin domaýynda örneşiklik taýýarlaýarys. Netijelerimiz tarapyndan berilýär, nusgalarymyz oýun we ýakynlaşyk çykyşyk çykyşyklarymyz bilen, käwagt kiçi ýa-da gowy düzeltmelidir we örän uly korpora degişläp bilýärler. Soňunda, biz öz veri setirlerimizi we öňünden öňünden öňünden täze nusgalarymyzy publika mejbur edip bilýäris. Bu ýerde Reviews2Movielens, Amazon filmiň ~1B word corpus(He and McAuley, 2016) filmLens tags (Harper and Konstan, 2016) we Reddit Film maslahatlary bilen täbiýal dil soraglary we jemgyýetçilik täglerini bar.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir istražuje učenje bogatih autonadzornih predstavljanja entiteta iz velikih količina povezanih teksta. Nakon predobučenog, ovi modeli postaju primjenjivi na višestruke centralne zadatke kao što su redovni povratak, završenje baze znanja, odgovor na pitanja i više. Za razliku od ostalih metoda koje prikupljaju signale samopouzdanja temeljno na lokalnom kontekstu unutar rečenice, radikalno proširimo pojam konteksta da uključujemo bilo koji dostupni tekst povezan sa entitetom. To omogućava novu klasu moćnih, visokog kapaciteta predstavljanja koje na kraju mogu destilati mnogo korisnih informacija o entitetu iz višestrukih tekstskih izvora, bez bilo kojeg ljudskog nadzora. Predstavljamo nekoliko strategija obuke koje, za razliku od prethodnih pristupa, naučimo zajedno predviđati riječi i entitete - strategije koje uspoređujemo eksperimentalno o donjim zadacima u domenu TV-Filma, poput predviđanja filmova iz pregleda korisnika i pretraživanja prirodnog jezika. Kao što je dokazano rezultatima, naši modeli se uklapaju ili nadmađuju konkurentne osnovne linije, ponekad sa malo ili bez finalnih mjerenja, i također su u mogućnosti mjerenja na veoma veliku korporu. Konačno, naši podaci i predobučeni modeli javno dostupni. To uključuje Reviews2Movielens, mapiranje ~1B riječi korpusa Amazon filmskih revizija (On i McAuley, 2016) na filmske etikete (Harper i Konstan, 2016), kao i predloge Reddit filma sa prirodnim ispitivanjem jezika i odgovarajućim preporukama zajednice.', 'ca': "Aquest paper explora aprendre representacions rics d'entitats auto-supervisades a partir de grans quantitats de text associat. Once pre-trained, these models become applicable to multiple entity-centric tasks such as ranked retrieval, knowledge base completion, question answering, and more.  A diferència d'altres mètodes que recollen senyals d'autosupervisió basats només en un context local dins una frase, ampliem radicalment la noció de context per incloure qualsevol text disponible relacionat amb una entitat. This enables a new class of powerful, high-capacity representations that can ultimately distill much of the useful information about an entity from multiple text sources, without any human supervision.  We present several training strategies that, unlike prior approaches, learn to jointly predict words and entities - strategies we compare experimentally on downstream tasks in the TV-Movies domain, such as MovieLens tag prediction from user reviews and natural language movie search.  Com poden demostrar els resultats, els nostres models s'ajustan o superen les línies de base competitives, de vegades amb poc o sense ajustament, i també són capaços d'escalar fins a corpores molt grans. Finalment, fem públics els nostres conjunts de dades i models pré-entrenats. Això inclou Reviews2Movielens, mapeant el ~1B word corpus de les crítiques de la pel·lícula d'Amazon (He i McAuley, 2016) a les etiquetes de MovieLens (Harper i Konstan, 2016), així com suggeriments de Reddit Movie amb preguntes de llenguatge natural i recomanacions comunitaries correspondents.", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa tarkastellaan rikkaiden itsevalvottujen kokonaisuuksien esittämistä suurista määristä siihen liittyvää tekstiä. Esikoulutuksen jälkeen näitä malleja voidaan soveltaa useisiin kokonaisuuskentrisiin tehtäviin, kuten sijoitushakuun, tietopohjan täyttämiseen, kysymyksiin vastaamiseen jne. Toisin kuin muut menetelmät, jotka keräävät itsesääntelysignaaleja pelkästään paikalliseen kontekstiin perustuen lauseeseen, laajennamme kontekstin käsitettä radikaalisti koskemaan kaikkia olemassa olevia entiteettiin liittyviä tekstejä. Tämä mahdollistaa uuden luokan voimakkaita, suurikapasiteettisia esityksiä, jotka voivat lopulta tislata suuren osan hyödyllisestä informaatiosta kokonaisuudesta useista tekstilähteistä ilman ihmisen valvontaa. Esittelemme useita koulutusstrategioita, jotka, toisin kuin aikaisemmat lähestymistavat, oppivat ennustamaan yhdessä sanoja ja kokonaisuuksia - strategioita, joita vertaamme kokeellisesti TV-Movies-verkkotunnuksen loppupään tehtävissä, kuten MovieLens-tagien ennustaminen käyttäjien arvosteluista ja luonnollisen kielen elokuvahaku. Tulokset osoittavat, että mallimme sopivat yhteen tai ylittävät kilpailukykyiset perusviivat, joskus hienosäätöä ei ole juurikaan tai ei lainkaan, ja ne voivat myös skaalata hyvin suuriin korpusiin. Lopuksi julkaisemme aineistomme ja esikoulutetut mallit julkisesti saataville. Tämä sisältää Reviews2Movielensin, Amazonin elokuvaarvostelujen ~1B sanakorpusen (He ja McAuley, 2016) yhdistämisen MovieLens-tageihin (Harper ja Konstan, 2016), sekä Reddit Movie Ehdotuksia luonnollisen kielen kyselyillä ja vastaavilla yhteisön suosituksilla.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis uuritakse rikkalike isejärelevalve all olevate üksuste esituste õppimist suurtest kogustest seotud tekstist. Pärast eelõpet saavad need mudelid rakendatavaks mitme olemikeskse ülesande puhul, nagu järjestatud otsimine, teadmistebaasi lõpetamine, küsimustele vastamine jne. Erinevalt teistest meetoditest, mis koguvad isejärelevalve signaale, mis põhinevad ainult kohalikul kontekstil lauses, laiendame radikaalselt konteksti mõistet, et hõlmata kõik olemasolevad tekstid, mis on seotud olemiga. See võimaldab luua uue klassi võimsaid, suure võimsusega esitusi, mis võivad lõpuks destilleerida palju kasulikku teavet olemi kohta mitmest tekstiallikast ilma inimese järelevalveta. Esitleme mitmeid koolitusstrateegiaid, mis erinevalt varasematest lähenemisviisidest õpivad ühiselt ennustama sõnu ja olemeid - strateegiaid, mida võrdleme eksperimentaalselt TV-Filmide valdkonnas alljärgnevate ülesannete puhul, nagu MovieLens sildi prognoosimine kasutajate ülevaatetest ja looduskeelsetest filmide otsingutest. Nagu näitavad tulemused, sobivad meie mudelid või ületavad konkurentsivõimelisi lähtejooni, mõnikord vähese või üldse peenhäälestusega, ning suudavad ulatuda ka väga suurte korpusteni. Lõpuks teeme oma andmekogumid ja eelkoolitud mudelid avalikult kättesaadavaks. See hõlmab Reviews2Movielensi, Amazoni filmide ülevaatete ~1B sõnakorpuse kaardistamist MovieLensi siltideks (Harper ja Konstan, 2016), samuti Reddit Movie Soovitusi looduskeele päringute ja vastavate kogukonna soovitustega.', 'cs': 'Tento článek zkoumá učení bohatých reprezentací entit pod vlastním dohledem z velkého množství přidruženého textu. Po předškolení se tyto modely stanou aplikovatelné pro více úkolů zaměřených na entity, jako je vyhledávání hodnocení, dokončování znalostní báze, zodpovězení otázek a další. Na rozdíl od jiných metod, které sbírají signály sebeohledu založené pouze na lokálním kontextu ve větě, radikálně rozšiřujeme pojem kontextu o jakýkoli dostupný text související s entitou. To umožňuje novou třídu výkonných, vysokokapacitních reprezentací, které dokážou nakonec destilovat mnoho užitečných informací o entitě z více textových zdrojů, bez jakéhokoliv lidského dohledu. Představujeme několik tréninkových strategií, které se na rozdíl od předchozích přístupů naučí společně předpovídat slova a entity, které experimentálně porovnáváme na následných úkolech v doméně TV-Movies, jako je predikce tagů MovieLens z uživatelských recenzí a vyhledávání filmů v přirozeném jazyce. Jak dokazují výsledky, naše modely odpovídají nebo překonávají konkurenční základní linie, někdy s malým nebo žádným jemným laděním, a jsou také schopny škálovat na velmi velké korpusy. Nakonec zpřístupníme naše datové sady a předškolené modely veřejně. To zahrnuje Reviews2Movielens, mapování ~1B slovního korpusu recenzí filmů Amazon (He a McAuley, 2016) na tagy MovieLens (Harper a Konstan, 2016), stejně jako Reddit Movie Suggestions s dotazy přirozeného jazyka a odpovídající doporučení komunity.', 'jv': 'Perintah sing dipunangé kelas nang sampeyan akeh dumadhi sing sampeyan nêmên kuwi mau. Yuta ono mulai, akeh-akeh lanir, model iki dadi wis aplikasi kanggo sampeyan siji-centeric dadi iki ning kelas pengaturan, akeh sabanjur-sakjane, njuk dianggap layar, lan akeh dumadhi. Wurunggo yèn sistem sing wis ngerasakno sampeyan luwih apik dadi bener Iki iso ngejaraké kelas sing paling sênêr, akeh-kapasitên sing bisa nguasai mulai gak dhéwé kuwi duluran Informasi sing nêmêr dilapik dhéwé, sampek iso nguasai kapasitêm sing menehi kudu We present multi-cursing policy that, unlike before accesses, Learn to joinly preview words and titles - Astres we align Esperamentaly on downtream tasks in the TV-Films domain, like FilmLens tag preview from user behs and normal language film Search. Tanggahi ugih-winih sing ditawakmu, dadi model sing beraksi ngono nggawe barang-barang sing perusahaan, dadi sing ngomongke ora ono sithik ora iso nggawe, lan kene iso nggawe barang beraksi iki banget tuli diapakan. Sokake, kita lagi dataset karo model sing wis ana luwih dumaten. Iki lak wis nambah Resaws2FilmLens, maping the ©1B word corus of the Boston film debutes (he and MekOuli, 2013) ngangge FilmLens tags (harp lan Kontan, 2011), tambah diumbane Resdit Film Suggestions barêng langkung popotes lan tambah bantugan komunitas tambah.', 'ha': "This paper explores learning rich self-supervised entity representations from large amounts of associated text.  @ info: whatsthis Di motsi da wasu shiryoyi waɗanda ke tsirarwa shaidar masu tsari da kansu, a kan wani muhalli na lokaci guda da wani magana, za'a buɗe zaɓen fikon muhimmin da za'a shigar da wani matsayi wanda ke da yanzu da wani abu. Wannan na iyar da wani kure na mai ƙarfi, mai ƙarfi, mai iya gaura, wanda ke iya rarraba masu yawa na da amfani ga abubuwa masu amfani daga sourcen misali masu yawa, kuma bã da wani bincike wa mutum. Tuna halatar da takwai masu tsari da, a motsi da kafaffiyata ta gabãni, za ka fahimta kungiyar ka gabatar da magana da abubuwa - tactiyiyiyinin da Muke samfani masu sami da masu aiki a downriver cikin filayen-filamu, kamar misãlin MovieLen's tag ya yi bayani daga tafarki na misãlai na karatun filamu na asili. Kama da aka jarraba fassarata, misalinmu sunã kami ko kuma sunã sami misalin mutane, a lokacin da bã ya da sauri ko kuma ba su iya sami zuwa makampuni mai girma. Gani, za mu sami tsarinanmu da misãlai masu da aka yi wa zaman tsari da bayani. Movies 2", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek raziskuje učenje bogatih samonadzorovanih predstavitev entitet iz velikih količin povezanega besedila. Po predhodnem usposabljanju se ti modeli uporabljajo za več opravil, osredotočenih na subjekte, kot so razvrščeno iskanje, dokončanje baze znanja, odgovarjanje na vprašanja in še več. Za razliko od drugih metod, ki zbirajo signale samonadzora, ki temeljijo zgolj na lokalnem kontekstu znotraj stavka, radikalno razširimo pojem konteksta, tako da vključimo vse razpoložljivo besedilo, povezano z entiteto. To omogoča nov razred močnih, visokozmogljivih predstavitev, ki lahko končno pridobijo veliko koristnih informacij o entiteti iz več besedilnih virov brez človeškega nadzora. Predstavljamo več strategij usposabljanja, ki se v nasprotju s prejšnjimi pristopi naučijo skupno napovedovati besede in entitete - strategije, ki jih eksperimentalno primerjamo pri nadaljnjih opravilih v domeni TV-Filmi, kot je napoved oznak MovieLens iz pregledov uporabnikov in iskanje filmov v naravnem jeziku. Kot dokazujejo rezultati, se naši modeli ujemajo ali presegajo konkurenčne osnovne linije, včasih z malo ali brez natančnega nastavitve, in so sposobni tudi razširiti do zelo velikih korpusov. Nazadnje, naše nabore podatkov in vnaprej usposobljene modele dajemo na voljo javnosti. To vključuje Reviews2Movielens, preslikavo ~1B besednega korpusa ocen Amazon filmov (He in McAuley, 2016) na oznake MovieLens (Harper in Konstan, 2016), kot tudi predloge za filme Reddit s poizvedbami v naravnem jeziku in ustreznimi priporočili skupnosti.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה חוקר את לימוד מייצגים עשירים של ישויות משגיחות עצמיות ממספרים גדולים של טקסט מחובר. ברגע שאומנים מראש, הדוגמנים האלה הופכים להיות אפשריים למשימות מרובות מרכזיות-יחידות, כמו השיגור ברמה, השלמת בסיס הידע, עניין לשאלות, ויותר. בניגוד לשיטות אחרות שקציר אותות על פיקוח עצמי מבוססים רק על קשר מקומי בתוך משפט, אנו מרחיבים באופן רדיקלי את הרעיון של הקשר כדי לכלול כל טקסט זמין שקשור ליחידה. זה מאפשר שיעור חדש של מייצגים חזקים ויכולים גבוהים שיכולים בסופו של דבר למנוח את רבת המידע היעיל על ישות ממקורי טקסט רבים, ללא שום פיקוח אנושי. We present several training strategies that, unlike prior approaches, learn to jointly predict words and entities - strategies we compare experimentally on downstream tasks in the TV-Movies domain, such as MovieLens tag prediction from user reviews and natural language movie search.  כפי שנראה על ידי התוצאות, הדוגמנים שלנו מתאימים או יוצאים מעל קווי בסיס תחרותיים, לפעמים עם מעט או בלי התאים, וגם מסוגלים לגדול לגודל מאוד גדול. סוף סוף, אנחנו מכניסים את קבוצת המידע שלנו ומודלים מאומנים מראש לפומבי. This includes Reviews2Movielens, mapping the ~1B word corpus of Amazon movie reviews (He and McAuley, 2016) to MovieLens tags (Harper and Konstan, 2016), as well as Reddit Movie Suggestions with natural language queries and corresponding community recommendations.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་རང་ཉིད་ལྟ་རྟོག སྔོན་གྲངས་སྔོན་འཛིན་གྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་འདི་དག་གི་དབུས་ཆ་སྣ་འཛིན་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་ལ་འཇུག་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། རང་ཉིད་ལྟ་རྟོག འདིས་དབྱིབས་ཤིག་བྱས་ཆེན་དང་མཐོ་རིམ་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་འཇུག་ཐུབ་པའི་སྐབས་ཡིག་ཆ་མཐོ་རྩོམ་པ་ཞིག་ལ་འཇུག We present several training strategies that, unlike prior approaches, learn to jointly predict words and entities - strategies we compare experimentally on downstream tasks in the TV-Movies domain, such as MovieLens tag prediction from user reviews and natural language movie search. ང་ཚོའི་མིག་རྩལ་བ་ནི་གསལ་བཤད་པ་ཞིག་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་མིག་རྩལ་གཞི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་དང་ཁྱད་པར་མཐུན་གྲངས་ཀ་ཡོད། མཐའ་མར་མ་དེར། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་དང་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་མིག་དཔེ་མང་ཆོས་སྤྱོད་ This includes Reviews2Movielens, mapping the ~1B word corpus of Amazon movie reviews (He and McAuley, 2016) to MovieLens tags (Harper and Konstan, 2016), as well as Reddit Movie Suggestions with natural language queries and corresponding community recommendations.'}
{'en': 'Scientific Discourse Tagging for Evidence Extraction', 'ar': 'وسم الخطاب العلمي لاستخراج الأدلة', 'es': 'Etiquetado de discursos científicos para la extracción de pruebas', 'pt': 'Marcação de Discurso Científico para Extração de Evidências', 'ja': '証拠抽出のための科学的な議論のタグ付け', 'fr': "Marquage du discours scientifique pour l'extraction de preuves", 'ru': 'Тегирование научного дискурса для извлечения доказательств', 'zh': '取证科学语', 'hi': 'साक्ष्य निष्कर्षण के लिए वैज्ञानिक प्रवचन टैगिंग', 'ga': 'Clibeáil Dioscúrsa Eolaíoch le haghaidh Eastóscadh Fianaise', 'el': 'Επισήμανση επιστημονικής συζήτησης για εξαγωγή αποδεικτικών στοιχείων', 'ka': 'Name', 'kk': 'Құжаттарды тарқату үшін ғылыми дискурстарды таңдау', 'hu': 'Tudományos beszéd címkézése a bizonyítékok kivonásához', 'it': "Etichettatura del discorso scientifico per l'estrazione delle prove", 'mk': 'Scientific Discourse Tagging for Evidence Extraction', 'ml': 'തെളിവുകള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുവാനുള്ള ശാസ്ത്രിക വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ടാഗ്ഗിങ്ങ്', 'lt': 'Scientific Discourse Tagging for Evidence Extraction', 'ms': 'Scientific Discourse Tagging for Evidence Extraction', 'mt': 'Tagging ta’ Diskors Xjentifiku għall-Estrazzjoni tal-Evidenza', 'mn': 'Шинжлэх ухааны хэлбэрүүд', 'no': 'Vitskapelige oppslag for utpakking av beviser', 'pl': 'Naukowe oznaczanie dyskursu dla ekstrakcji dowodów', 'so': 'Ka baaraandegista baaritaanka cilmiga', 'ro': 'Etichetarea discursului științific pentru extragerea probelor', 'sr': 'Znanstveni obrazac za ekstrakciju dokaza', 'ta': 'தெளிவாக்குவதற்கான அறிவியல் விவரம் ஒட்டுதல்', 'si': 'විද්\u200dයාණික හොයාගන්න සාක්ෂික ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාව සඳහා ටැග් කරන්න', 'sv': 'Vetenskaplig diskursmärkning för evidens utvinning', 'ur': 'سائنس ڈسکورس ٹاگ ڈاکٹنگ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'da': 'Videnskabelig diskurs Tagging for Evidence Extraction', 'hr': 'Znanstvena oznake za izvlačenje dokaza', 'nl': 'Wetenschappelijke discourse tagging voor bewijsextractie', 'bg': 'Маркиране на научни дискусии за извличане на доказателства', 'de': 'Wissenschaftliche Diskurse Tagging für Evidenzextraktion', 'ko': '증거 추출에 사용되는 과학 문장 표기', 'tr': 'Ilmi Hatlar', 'sw': 'Uchapishaji wa Ujasusi wa Sayansi kwa ajili ya Uchunguzi', 'id': 'Tagging Scientific Discourse for Evidence Extraction', 'sq': 'Etiketa e diskutimit shkencor për nxjerrjen e provave', 'fa': 'گفتگوهای علمی برای اخراج مدرک', 'af': 'Wetenskaplike Ontwikkeling Etiket vir Wittige Uitpakking', 'az': 'İşahidlər çıxarılması üçün bilimsel diskurs etiketi', 'hy': 'Ավկայությունների հանելու համար գիտական խոսակցություն', 'bn': 'প্রমাণ এক্সট্র্যাকশনের জন্য বৈজ্ঞানিক তথ্য ট্যাগিং', 'bs': 'Znanstveni obrazac za izvlačenje dokaza', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'ca': 'Scientific Discourse Tagging for Evidence Extraction', 'cs': 'Vědecké diskurzní značení pro extrakci důkazů', 'et': 'Teadusliku diskursuse märgistamine tõendite väljavõtmiseks', 'fi': 'Tieteellisen diskurssin merkitseminen todisteiden talteenottoa varten', 'jv': 'Language', 'sk': 'Označevanje znanstvenih diskurzov za pridobivanje dokazov', 'he': 'Scientific Discourse Tagging for Evidence Extraction', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Scientific Discourse Tagging for Evidence Extraction'}
{'en': 'Evidence plays a crucial role in any biomedical research narrative, providing justification for some claims and refutation for others. We seek to build models of scientific argument using information extraction methods from full-text papers. We present the capability of automatically extracting text fragments from primary research papers that describe the evidence presented in that paper’s figures, which arguably provides the raw material of any scientific argument made within the paper. We apply richly contextualized deep representation learning pre-trained on biomedical domain corpus to the analysis of scientific discourse structures and the extraction of evidence fragments (i.e., the text in the results section describing data presented in a specified subfigure) from a set of biomedical experimental research articles. We first demonstrate our state-of-the-art scientific discourse tagger on two scientific discourse tagging datasets and its transferability to new datasets. We then show the benefit of leveraging scientific discourse tags for downstream tasks such as claim-extraction and evidence fragment detection. Our work demonstrates the potential of using evidence fragments derived from figure spans for improving the quality of scientific claims by cataloging, indexing and reusing evidence fragments as independent documents.', 'fr': "Les preuves jouent un rôle crucial dans tout récit de recherche biomédicale, justifiant certaines affirmations et réfutant d'autres. Nous cherchons à construire des modèles d'argumentation scientifique en utilisant des méthodes d'extraction d'informations à partir d'articles en texte intégral. Nous présentons la capacité d'extraire automatiquement des fragments de texte à partir d'articles de recherche primaires qui décrivent les preuves présentées dans les figures de cet article, ce qui fournit sans doute la matière première de tout argument scientifique avancé dans l'article. Nous appliquons l'apprentissage approfondi des représentations richement contextualisées et pré-entraînées sur des corpus de domaines biomédicaux à l'analyse des structures du discours scientifique et à l'extraction de «\xa0fragments de preuves\xa0» (c'est-à-dire le texte dans la section des résultats décrivant les données présentées dans une sous-figure spécifiée) à partir d'un ensemble de articles de recherche expérimentale. Nous faisons d'abord la démonstration de notre tagger de discours scientifique de pointe sur deux ensembles de données de marquage de discours scientifique et de sa transférabilité à de nouveaux ensembles de données. Nous montrons ensuite l'avantage de tirer parti des étiquettes de discours scientifiques pour des tâches en aval telles que l'extraction de revendications et la détection de fragments de preuves. Nos travaux démontrent le potentiel de l'utilisation de fragments de preuves dérivés de portées de figures pour améliorer la qualité des allégations scientifiques en cataloguant, indexant et réutilisant des fragments de preuves en tant que documents indépendants.", 'pt': 'A evidência desempenha um papel crucial em qualquer narrativa de pesquisa biomédica, fornecendo justificativa para algumas alegações e refutação para outras. Buscamos construir modelos de argumentação científica usando métodos de extração de informações de artigos de texto completo. Apresentamos a capacidade de extrair automaticamente fragmentos de texto de trabalhos de pesquisa primária que descrevem as evidências apresentadas nas figuras desse artigo, o que provavelmente fornece a matéria-prima de qualquer argumento científico feito dentro do artigo. Aplicamos o aprendizado de representação profunda ricamente contextualizado pré-treinado em corpus de domínio biomédico para a análise de estruturas de discurso científico e a extração de “fragmentos de evidência” (ou seja, o texto na seção de resultados que descreve os dados apresentados em uma subfigura especificada) de um conjunto de artigos de pesquisa experimental biomédica. Primeiro demonstramos nosso marcador de discurso científico de última geração em dois conjuntos de dados de marcação de discurso científico e sua transferibilidade para novos conjuntos de dados. Em seguida, mostramos o benefício de aproveitar as tags de discurso científico para tarefas posteriores, como extração de declarações e detecção de fragmentos de evidências. Nosso trabalho demonstra o potencial do uso de fragmentos de evidências derivados de extensões de figuras para melhorar a qualidade de afirmações científicas por meio da catalogação, indexação e reutilização de fragmentos de evidências como documentos independentes.', 'ar': 'يلعب الدليل دورًا حاسمًا في أي سرد بحثي طبي حيوي ، حيث يوفر مبررًا لبعض الادعاءات ودحضًا للآخرين. نسعى لبناء نماذج للحجة العلمية باستخدام طرق استخلاص المعلومات من النصوص الكاملة للأوراق. نقدم القدرة على استخراج أجزاء النص تلقائيًا من أوراق البحث الأولية التي تصف الأدلة المقدمة في أشكال تلك الورقة ، والتي يمكن القول إنها توفر المادة الخام لأي حجة علمية يتم إجراؤها داخل الورقة. نقوم بتطبيق تعليم التمثيل العميق المنسق بشكل غني والمدرَّب مسبقًا على مجموعة المجال الطبي الحيوي لتحليل هياكل الخطاب العلمي واستخراج "شظايا الأدلة" (أي النص في قسم النتائج الذي يصف البيانات المقدمة في شكل فرعي محدد) من مجموعة من مقالات البحوث التجريبية الطبية الحيوية. نعرض أولاً أداة تمييز الخطاب العلمي الحديثة الخاصة بنا على خطين علميين يحددان مجموعات البيانات وإمكانية نقلها إلى مجموعات بيانات جديدة. ثم نعرض فائدة الاستفادة من علامات الخطاب العلمي للمهام النهائية مثل استخلاص الادعاءات واكتشاف شظايا الأدلة. يوضح عملنا إمكانية استخدام شظايا الأدلة المستمدة من نطاقات الأشكال لتحسين جودة الادعاءات العلمية عن طريق فهرسة أجزاء الأدلة وفهرستها وإعادة استخدامها كوثائق مستقلة.', 'es': 'La evidencia desempeña un papel crucial en cualquier narrativa de investigación biomédica, ya que justifica algunas afirmaciones y refuta otras. Buscamos construir modelos de argumento científico utilizando métodos de extracción de información de artículos de texto completo. Presentamos la capacidad de extraer automáticamente fragmentos de texto de trabajos de investigación primarios que describen la evidencia presentada en las figuras de ese artículo, lo que podría decirse que proporciona la materia prima de cualquier argumento científico hecho dentro del artículo. Aplicamos el aprendizaje de representación profunda ricamente contextualizado previamente entrenado en corpus de dominio biomédico al análisis de las estructuras del discurso científico y la extracción de «fragmentos de evidencia» (es decir, el texto de la sección de resultados que describe los datos presentados en una subfigura específica) de un conjunto de artículos de investigación experimental. Primero demostramos nuestro etiquetador de discursos científicos de última generación en dos conjuntos de datos de etiquetado de discursos científicos y su transferibilidad a nuevos conjuntos de datos. A continuación, mostramos el beneficio de aprovechar las etiquetas de discurso científico para tareas posteriores, como la extracción de afirmaciones y la detección de fragmentos de evidencia. Nuestro trabajo demuestra el potencial de utilizar fragmentos de evidencia derivados de la extensión de las figuras para mejorar la calidad de las afirmaciones científicas mediante la catalogación, la indexación y la reutilización de fragmentos de evidencia como documentos independientes.', 'ja': 'エビデンスは、生物医学研究の物語において重要な役割を果たし、いくつかの主張と他の主張に対する反証を提供します。 全文論文からの情報抽出手法を用いて、科学的議論のモデルを構築しようとしている。 私たちは、その論文の図で提示された証拠を記述する一次研究論文からテキストの断片を自動的に抽出する機能を提示しています。これは、論文内で行われた科学的議論の原料を提供していると言えるでしょう。 私たちは、生物医学領域のコーパスに関する事前トレーニングを受けた豊富な文脈化された深層表現学習を、一連の生物医学実験研究論文からの科学的な話題構造の分析と「証拠の断片」（すなわち、指定されたサブ図に示されたデータを説明する結果セクションのテキスト）の抽出に適用します。 私たちはまず、2つの科学的な話題タグ付けデータセットと新しいデータセットへの転送性について、最先端の科学的話題タグ付けを実演します。 次に、クレーム抽出や証拠断片検出などのダウンストリームタスクに科学的な話題タグを活用する利点を示します。 私たちの研究は、図から派生した証拠断片を使用して、証拠断片を独立した文書としてカタログ化、インデックス作成、再利用することで、科学的主張の質を向上させる可能性を示しています。', 'zh': '证生物医学论叙,皆有至用,为某主张,为他说驳。 试用全文信息取法立科学论证模样。 吾等申其本片段,述其数证,可谓论文之科学论证矣。 将生物医学领域语料库预训之丰上下文化深度,示学宜于科学语结构之分,并取证于群生物医学实验之片段(即,而述特定子图之文本)。 首于两科学语标数集上示最先进科学语标记器及对新数集之可转移性。 然后示以科学言下事(如索赔取证片段检)之利。 臣等证用从图跨度证片段之力,类于证片段,索引用为独立科学声明之质。', 'hi': 'साक्ष्य किसी भी जैव चिकित्सा अनुसंधान कथा में एक महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाता है, कुछ दावों के लिए औचित्य प्रदान करता है और दूसरों के लिए खंडन करता है। हम पूर्ण-पाठ पत्रों से जानकारी निष्कर्षण विधियों का उपयोग करके वैज्ञानिक तर्क के मॉडल का निर्माण करना चाहते हैं। हम प्राथमिक शोध पत्रों से स्वचालित रूप से पाठ के टुकड़े निकालने की क्षमता प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो उस पेपर के आंकड़ों में प्रस्तुत सबूतों का वर्णन करते हैं, जो यकीनन पेपर के भीतर किए गए किसी भी वैज्ञानिक तर्क का कच्चा माल प्रदान करता है। हम वैज्ञानिक प्रवचन संरचनाओं के विश्लेषण और "साक्ष्य टुकड़े" के निष्कर्षण के लिए बायोमेडिकल डोमेन कॉर्पस पर पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित समृद्ध रूप से प्रासंगिक गहरे प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने को लागू करते हैं (यानी, एक निर्दिष्ट उपचित्र में प्रस्तुत डेटा का वर्णन करने वाले परिणाम अनुभाग में पाठ) बायोमेडिकल प्रयोगात्मक अनुसंधान लेखों के एक सेट से। हम पहले दो वैज्ञानिक प्रवचन टैगिंग डेटासेट और नए डेटासेट के लिए इसकी हस्तांतरणीयता पर हमारे अत्याधुनिक वैज्ञानिक प्रवचन टैगर का प्रदर्शन करते हैं। फिर हम डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्यों जैसे कि दावा-निष्कर्षण और साक्ष्य टुकड़ा का पता लगाने के लिए वैज्ञानिक प्रवचन टैग का लाभ उठाने का लाभ दिखाते हैं। हमारा काम स्वतंत्र दस्तावेजों के रूप में साक्ष्य टुकड़ों को सूचीबद्ध करने, अनुक्रमण करने और पुन: उपयोग करके वैज्ञानिक दावों की गुणवत्ता में सुधार के लिए आंकड़े से प्राप्त साक्ष्य टुकड़ों का उपयोग करने की क्षमता को दर्शाता है।', 'ru': 'Доказательства играют решающую роль в любом описании биомедицинских исследований, предоставляя обоснование для одних утверждений и опровержение для других. Мы стремимся построить модели научной аргументации, используя методы извлечения информации из полнотекстовых статей. Мы представляем возможность автоматического извлечения фрагментов текста из первичных исследовательских работ, которые описывают доказательства, представленные в рисунках этой работы, что, возможно, обеспечивает исходный материал для любого научного аргумента, сделанного в документе. Мы применяем богато контекстуализированное глубокое репрезентативное обучение, предварительно обученное на корпусе биомедицинской области, к анализу структур научного дискурса и извлечению «фрагментов доказательств» (т.е. текста в разделе результатов, описывающего данные, представленные в определенной подрисунке) из набора биомедицинских экспериментальных исследовательских статей. Сначала мы демонстрируем наш современный тегер научного дискурса на двух наборах данных для метки научного дискурса и его переносимость в новые наборы данных. Затем мы показываем преимущество использования тегов научного дискурса для последующих задач, таких как извлечение утверждений и обнаружение фрагментов доказательств. Наша работа демонстрирует потенциал использования фрагментов доказательств, полученных из диапазонов фигур, для улучшения качества научных утверждений путем каталогизации, индексирования и повторного использования фрагментов доказательств в качестве независимых документов.', 'ga': 'Tá ról ríthábhachtach ag an bhfianaise in aon scéal taighde bithleighis, ag soláthar bonn cirt do roinnt éileamh agus bréagnú do dhaoine eile. Déanaimid iarracht samhlacha d’argóintí eolaíocha a thógáil ag úsáid modhanna asbhainte faisnéise ó pháipéir lán-théacs. Cuirimid i láthair an cumas blúirí téacs a bhaint go huathoibríoch as páipéir thaighde príomhúla a chuireann síos ar an bhfianaise a chuirtear i láthair i bhfigiúirí an pháipéir sin, a sholáthraíonn amhábhar aon argóint eolaíoch a dhéantar laistigh den pháipéar, d’fhéadfaí a áitiú. Cuirimid i bhfeidhm an fhoghlaim dhomhainléirithe atá comhthéacsaithe go saibhir réamh-oilte ar chorpas fearainn bithleighis chun anailís a dhéanamh ar struchtúir dioscúrsa eolaíochta agus asbhaint “blúirí fianaise” (i.e. an téacs i rannán na dtorthaí ina ndéantar cur síos ar shonraí a chuirtear i láthair i bhfo-fhigiúr sonraithe) ó thacar de earraí taighde turgnamhacha bithleighis. Léirímid ar dtús ár gclibeoir dioscúrsa eolaíoch úrscothach ar dhá thacar sonraí clibeála dioscúrsa eolaíochta agus a inaistritheacht chuig tacair shonraí nua. Taispeánaimid ansin an buntáiste a bhaineann le clibeanna dioscúrsa eolaíochta a ghiaráil le haghaidh tascanna iartheachtacha mar éileamh-eastóscadh agus braite blúirí fianaise. Léiríonn ár gcuid oibre an poitéinseal atá ann blúirí fianaise a bhaint as réisí fíoracha chun cáilíocht na n-éileamh eolaíoch a fheabhsú trí chatalógú, innéacsú agus athúsáid blúirí fianaise mar dhoiciméid neamhspleácha.', 'hu': 'A bizonyítékok kulcsfontosságú szerepet játszanak minden orvosbiológiai kutatási elbeszélésben, bizonyos állítások igazolását, mások számára pedig cáfolást nyújtanak. Célunk tudományos érvelési modelleket építeni teljes szövegű cikkekből származó információkinyerési módszerekkel. Bemutatjuk azt a képességet, hogy az elsődleges kutatási cikkekből automatikusan kivonjuk a szövegtöredékeket, amelyek leírják a cikk ábráiban bemutatott bizonyítékokat, amelyek vitathatóan biztosítják bármely tudományos érv alapanyagát. A tudományos diskurzus struktúrák elemzésére és "bizonyíték fragmentációk" (azaz az eredmények szakaszában meghatározott alfigurában bemutatott adatokat leíró szöveg) kinyerésére az orvosbiológiai kísérleti cikkek sorozatából, gazdagon kontextualizált mélyreprezentációs tanulást alkalmazunk. Először két tudományos diskurzuscímkéző adatkészleten mutatjuk be korszerű tudományos diskurzuscímkézőnket és annak átvihetőségét új adatkészletekbe. Ezt követően megmutatjuk, milyen előnyös a tudományos diskurzuscímkék hasznosítása olyan downstream feladatokhoz, mint például a követelések kivonása és a bizonyítékok töredékeinek felismerése. Munkánk azt mutatja be, hogy milyen lehetőségeket lehet felhasználni a tudományos állítások minőségének javítására a bizonyítékok töredékeinek független dokumentumokként való katalogizálásával, indexelésével és újrafelhasználásával.', 'ka': "ეჲკაჱარვლჟრგა თმა მნჲდჲ გაზნჲჟრ პჲლ გ გჟთფკთ ბთჲმვეთუთნჟკთ პაჱსფთრვლნთ პარართრთ, კჲირჲ ეპსდთრვ თჟკარ ეა ჲოპაგწრ ჲოპაგთრვლჟრგჲ ჩვენ ძალიან გავაკეთოთ მეცნიერო არგუმენტის მოდელები ინფორმაციის გამოყენებით ინფორმაციის გამოყენებით ყველა ტექსტის დომენტიდან. ჩვენ ავტომატურად ტექსტის ფრეგრამეტრების გამოყენების შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც პირველი სწავლობის კონფიგრამეტრების კონფიგრამეტრებით გამოყენებენ, რომელიც აღწერს ამ კონფიგრამეტრებ ჩვენ განვიყენებთ ბიომედიციო დემონიკური კოპუსში, რომელიც უცნობიერო დემონიკური სტრუქტურების ანალიზაციისთვის და 'წარმოდგენების ფრაქტურების' ტექსტის გამოყენებას (მაგალითად, წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენება,  ჩვენ პირველად ჩვენი სახელსაწყისი მეცნიერო დისკურსების ტეგერაზე ჩვენი მეცნიერო დისკურსების მონაცემები და მისი მონაცემები ახალ დიაკოსტებში. შემდეგ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ მეცნიერო დისკურსების ჭდეების გამოსახულება, როგორც კონტრექცია-ექსტრექცია და კონტრექცია ფრაქციების განსახულება. ჩვენი სამუშაო მუშაობაში გამოყენება საკუთარი ფრაქტურების ფრაქტურების ფრაქტურების ფრაქტურების ფრაქტურების გასაკეთებლად, ინდექსირება და გამოყენება საკუთარი ფრაქტურების", 'el': 'Τα στοιχεία διαδραματίζουν κρίσιμο ρόλο σε κάθε βιοϊατρική ερευνητική αφήγηση, παρέχοντας δικαιολογία για ορισμένους ισχυρισμούς και αντικρούσεις για άλλους. Επιδιώκουμε να οικοδομήσουμε μοντέλα επιστημονικών επιχειρημάτων χρησιμοποιώντας μεθόδους εξαγωγής πληροφοριών από εργασίες πλήρους κειμένου. Παρουσιάζουμε την ικανότητα αυτόματης εξαγωγής αποσπασμάτων κειμένου από πρωτογενείς ερευνητικές εργασίες που περιγράφουν τα αποδεικτικά στοιχεία που παρουσιάζονται στα στοιχεία αυτής της εργασίας, τα οποία αναμφισβήτητα παρέχουν την πρώτη ύλη οποιουδήποτε επιστημονικού επιχειρήματος που γίνεται μέσα στην εργασία. Εφαρμόζουμε την πλούσια πλαισιωμένη εκμάθηση βαθιάς αναπαράστασης προ-εκπαιδευμένη στο σώμα βιοϊατρικών τομέων στην ανάλυση των δομών επιστημονικού λόγου και στην εξαγωγή "θραύσματα αποδεικτικών στοιχείων" (δηλαδή το κείμενο στην ενότητα αποτελεσμάτων που περιγράφει δεδομένα που παρουσιάζονται σε συγκεκριμένη υποεικόνα) από ένα σύνολο βιοϊατρικών πειραματικών ερευνητικών άρθρων. Αρχικά επιδεικνύουμε την υπερσύγχρονη συσκευή παρακολούθησης επιστημονικού λόγου σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων επιστημονικού λόγου και τη δυνατότητα μεταφοράς του σε νέα σύνολα δεδομένων. Στη συνέχεια, καταδεικνύουμε το όφελος της αξιοποίησης ετικετών επιστημονικού λόγου για μεταγενέστερες εργασίες, όπως η εξαγωγή ισχυρισμών και η ανίχνευση θραυσμάτων αποδεικτικών στοιχείων. Η εργασία μας καταδεικνύει τη δυνατότητα χρήσης θραυσμάτων αποδεικτικών στοιχείων που προέρχονται από φάσεις σχημάτων για τη βελτίωση της ποιότητας των επιστημονικών ισχυρισμών με την καταλογογράφηση, την ευρετηρίαση και την επαναχρησιμοποίηση θραυσμάτων αποδεικτικών στοιχείων ως ανεξάρτητα έγγραφα.', 'it': 'Le prove svolgono un ruolo cruciale in qualsiasi narrazione di ricerca biomedica, fornendo giustificazione per alcune affermazioni e confutazione per altre. Cerchiamo di costruire modelli di argomentazione scientifica utilizzando metodi di estrazione delle informazioni da documenti full-text. Presentiamo la capacità di estrarre automaticamente frammenti di testo da documenti di ricerca primari che descrivono le prove presentate nelle figure di quel documento, che probabilmente fornisce la materia prima di qualsiasi argomento scientifico fatto all\'interno del documento. Applichiamo un apprendimento di rappresentazione profonda riccamente contestualizzato pre-addestrato sul corpus di dominio biomedico all\'analisi delle strutture del discorso scientifico e all\'estrazione di "frammenti di evidenza" (cioè, il testo nella sezione risultati che descrive i dati presentati in una sottofigura specifica) da una serie di articoli di ricerca biomedica sperimentale. Per prima cosa dimostriamo il nostro tagger scientifico all\'avanguardia su due set di dati di etichettatura del discorso scientifico e la sua trasferibilità a nuovi set di dati. Mostriamo quindi il vantaggio di sfruttare i tag scientifici del discorso per attività a valle come l\'estrazione di reclami e la rilevazione di frammenti di prove. Il nostro lavoro dimostra il potenziale di utilizzare frammenti di evidenza derivati da intervalli di figure per migliorare la qualità delle affermazioni scientifiche catalogando, indicizzando e riutilizzando frammenti di evidenza come documenti indipendenti.', 'lt': 'Evidence plays a crucial role in any biomedical research narrative, providing justification for some claims and refutation for others.  Mes siekiame sukurti mokslinių argument ų modelius naudojant informacijos gavimo metodus iš tekstinių dokumentų. We present the capability of automatically extracting text fragments from primary research papers that describe the evidence presented in that paper\'s figures, which arguably provides the raw material of any scientific argument made within the paper.  Taikome daug konteksto turintį gilaus atstovavimo mokymąsi, parengtą biomedicinos srities korpusu, analizuojant mokslines diskurso struktūras ir i šimant "įrodymų fragmentus" (t. y. rezultatų skyriaus tekstą, kuriame aprašomi duomenys, pateikti konkrečiame pavyzdyje) iš biomedicinos eksperimentinių mokslinių tyrimų straipsnių rinkinio. Pirmiausia parodysime naujausią mokslinį diskurso žymėjimą apie du mokslinius diskurso žymėjimo duomenų rinkinius ir jų perdavimą naujiems duomenų rinkiniams. Tada parodysime naudą, kad būtų naudojami moksliniai diskursiniai ženklai tolesnėms užduotims, pvz., reikalavimų gavimui ir įrodymų fragmento nustatymui. Mūsų darbas rodo galimybę naudoti iš skaičių gautus įrodymų fragmentus siekiant pagerinti mokslinių teiginių kokybę kataloguojant, indeksuojant ir pakartotinai naudojant įrodymų fragmentus kaip nepriklausomus dokumentus.', 'mk': "Доказите играат клучна улога во секоја биомедицинска истражувачка приказна, обезбедувајќи оправдување за некои тврдења и одбивање за други. Ние се обидуваме да изградиме модели на научен аргумент користејќи методи на извлекување информации од цел текст документи. We present the capability of automatically extracting text fragments from primary research papers that describe the evidence presented in that paper's figures, which arguably provides the raw material of any scientific argument made within the paper.  Ние аплицираме богато контекстуализирано длабоко претставување учење предобучено на биомедицински домен корпус на анализата на научните дискурсни структури и извлекувањето на „фрагменти на докази“ (т.е., текстот во одделот за резултати кој ги опишува податоците претставени во специфицирана субфигура) од еден сет би Прво го демонстрираме нашиот најнов научен дискурсник за две научни дискурсници за означување на податоци и неговата трансферентност на нови податоци. Потоа ја покажуваме користта од искористувањето на научните дискурсни ознаки за понатамошните задачи како што се извлекување на барања и детекција на фрагменти на докази. Нашата работа го демонстрира потенцијалот да се користат фрагменти на докази кои се извлечени од бројките за подобрување на квалитетот на научните тврдења со каталогирање, индексирање и повторно употреба на фрагменти на докази како независни документи", 'kk': 'Кейбір сұрақтарды және басқалардың рефутикациясын жақсы түзету үшін бір биомедикалық зерттеулердің негізгі роли жасайды. Мәліметті толық мәтін қағаздардан шығару әдістерін қолданып ғылыми аргументтің үлгілерін құру керек. Мәтін фрагменттерін негізгі зерттеу құжаттарынан автоматты түрде тарқату мүмкіндігін көрсету мүмкіндігін таңдаймыз. Бұл қағаздың цифрларында көрсетілген барлық ғылыми аргументтерінің негізгі материалын келтіріп Біз биомедикалық эксперименталдық зерттеулер мақалаларынан биомедикалық домендегі корпустың алдын- ала оқылған тәртіпке тәртіпке тәртіпке түсіндірілген тәртіпке қолданып, ғылыми дискурстардың құрылымының анализациясына және "evidence fragments" (мәтін, мәті Біз біріншіден өзіміздің күй- жай ғылыми дискурстарымызды екі ғылыми дискурстардың деректер қорларына тегтерін және оның жаңа деректер қорларына аударуға мүмкіндік береді. Содан кейін біз ғылыми дискурстарды таңдау тегтерінің пайдалығын көрсетедік, мысалы, сұрақ-тарқату және дәлелді фрагменттерді таңдау үшін. Біздің жұмыстарымыз таңдау фрагменттерді таңдау үшін, каталогты, индекстеу және тәуелсіз құжаттар ретінде, ғылыми жағдайлардың сапатын жақсарту үшін, таңдау фрагменттерін қолдану мүмкінді', 'ms': "Evidence plays a crucial role in any biomedical research narrative, providing justification for some claims and refutation for others.  Kami mencari untuk membina model argumen saintifik menggunakan kaedah ekstraksi maklumat dari kertas teks penuh. We present the capability of automatically extracting text fragments from primary research papers that describe the evidence presented in that paper's figures, which arguably provides the raw material of any scientific argument made within the paper.  We apply richly contextualized deep representation learning pre-trained on biomedical domain corpus to the analysis of scientific discourse structures and the extraction of 'evidence fragments' (i.e., the text in the results section describing data presented in a specified subfigure) from a set of biomedical experimental research articles.  Kita pertama-tama menunjukkan tagger diskors saintifik kita yang terbaik pada dua set data tagging diskors saintifik dan kemampuannya dipindahkan ke set data baru. We then show the benefit of leveraging scientific discourse tags for downstream tasks such as claim-extraction and evidence fragment detection.  Our work demonstrates the potential of using evidence fragments derived from figure spans for improving the quality of scientific claims by cataloging, indexing and reusing evidence fragments as independent documents.", 'ml': 'Evidence plays a crucial role in any biomedical research narrative, providing justification for some claims and refutation for others.  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ശാസ്ത്രിക വാദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുവാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്നു പ്രധാനപരിശോധന പത്രത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ടെക്സ്റ്റെക്സ് ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വയം പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിന്റെ കഴിവ് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. ആ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും വി ബൈവിമെഡിക്കല്\u200d ഡോമെന്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്സില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന് മുന്\u200dപ് പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ആഴത്തിലുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ശാസ്ത്രസംസാര സംസാര സംസാരത്തിന്റെ ഘട്ടങ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ആദ്യം നമ്മുടെ സ്ഥാനത്തെ ശാസ്ത്ര സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ശാസ്ത്ര വാക്കുകളുടെ ടാഗ്ഗര്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. രണ്ട പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d ശാസ്ത്ര സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിന് ശാസ്ത്രീയ സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ടാഗുകള്\u200d കൊടുക്കുന്നതിന് ഉപകാരം കാണിച സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യ രേഖകളായി തെളിവുകള്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നതിനും, ശാസ്ത്രജ്ഞാനത്തിന്\u200dറെ സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യമായ രേഖകളായി തെളിവുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനും,', 'mn': 'Баталгаа нь ямар ч биологийн эмнэлгийн судалгааны зохиолд чухал нөлөөтэй байдаг. Зарим хүмүүст зөвшөөрөх, бусдын төлөө дахин сэргээх шалтгаан өгдөг. Бид шинжлэх ухааны аргументын загварыг бүтээхийг хүсч байна. Мэдээлэл бүрэн текст сонины аргуудыг ашиглаж байна. Бид анхны судалгааны баримтуудаас автоматжуулах чадварыг тайлбарлаж өгдөг. Энэ баримтууд цаасан дотор бүх шинжлэх ухааны аргументын жижиг материал гаргадаг. Бид биологийн эмнэлгийн туршилтын судалгааны баримтуудын шинжилгээнд биологийн эмнэлгийн корпус дээр суралцагдсан гүн гүн гүнзгий хэлбэрээр суралцаж суралцах сургалтыг бага зэрэг шинжлэх ухааны ярианы бүтээгдэхүүний шинжилгээр, баталгааны хэсэг (яг л баталгааны хэсэг дээр тодорх Эхлээд бид урлагийн шинжлэх ухааны талаар 2 шинжлэх ухааны талаар өгөгдлийн санг тэмдэглэх болон шинэ өгөгдлийн санд шилжүүлэх чадварыг харуулж байна. Дараа нь бид шинжлэх ухааны ярианы тэмдэгүүдийг ашиглах хэрэгтэй зүйлсийг харуулж байна. Бидний ажлын талаар шинжлэх ухааны талаар каталог, индекс болон бусад бичил баримтууд гэх мэт баталгааны хэсгийг ашиглах боломжийг харуулж байна.', 'mt': "Evidence plays a crucial role in any biomedical research narrative, providing justification for some claims and refutation for others.  We seek to build models of scientific argument using information extraction methods from full-text papers.  We present the capability of automatically extracting text fragments from primary research papers that describe the evidence presented in that paper's figures, which arguably provides the raw material of any scientific argument made within the paper.  We apply richly contextualized deep representation learning pre-trained on biomedical domain corpus to the analysis of scientific discourse structures and the extraction of 'evidence fragments' (i.e., the text in the results section describing data presented in a specified subfigure) from a set of biomedical experimental research articles.  We first demonstrate our state-of-the-art scientific discourse tagger on two scientific discourse tagging datasets and its transferability to new datasets.  Imbagħad naraw il-benefiċċju tal-ingranaġġ tat-tikketti xjentifiċi ta’ diskors għal kompiti downstream bħall-estrazzjoni tal-pretensjonijiet u l-identifikazzjoni tal-frammenti tal-evidenza. Ix-xogħol tagħna juri l-potenzjal li jintużaw frammenti ta’ evidenza derivati minn firxa ta’ ċifri għat-titjib tal-kwalità ta’ dikjarazzjonijiet xjentifiċi billi jikkatalgaw, jindikaw u jużaw mill-ġdid frammenti ta’ evidenza bħala dokumenti indipendenti.", 'no': 'Dokument speler ein viktig rolle i alle biomedisinske forskningsnarrativ, som gjer justifikasjon for nokre tiltak og refusjon for andre. Vi søkjer å bygge modeller av vitenskapelige argument med metodar for utpakking av informasjon frå fulltekstpapir. Vi presenterer kapasiteten for automatisk ekstrahering av tekstfragmenter frå primære forskningspapir som skildrar bevisene som er presentert i figurene på papiret, som tilbyr argumentet råmaterialen av alle vitenskapelige argument som er lagt i papiret. Vi bruker riktig kontekstualisert dyp representasjon som lærer før-trent på biomedisinske domenekorpus til analysen av vitenskapelige diskursstrukturer og utpakking av «evidence fragments» (t.d. teksten i resultatedelen som beskriver data presentert i e in spesifisert underfigur) frå eit sett av biomedisinske eksperimentelle forskningsartiklar. Vi viser først vårt tilstand i kunsten vitenskapelige diskursmerker på to vitenskapelige diskursar som merkar datasett og overfører dei til nye datasett. Vi viser derfor fordel til å leverara vitenskapelige diskursmerker for nedstrømte oppgåver, som claim-extraction og evidence fragment detection. Arbeidet vårt demonstrerer potensialen for å bruka evidensfragmenter utvikla frå figurmellomrom for å forbetra kvaliteten på vitenskapelige antar ved å katalogera, indeksera og gjenoppretta dokumentfragmenter som uavhengige dokument.', 'pl': 'Dowody odgrywają kluczową rolę w każdej historii badań biomedycznych, dostarczając uzasadnienia niektórych twierdzeń i obalenia dla innych. Staramy się budować modele argumentacji naukowej wykorzystując metody ekstrakcji informacji z prac pełnoprawnych. Przedstawiamy możliwość automatycznego wydobywania fragmentów tekstu z podstawowych prac badawczych opisujących dowody przedstawione na rysunkach tego artykułu, które prawdopodobnie stanowią surowiec dowolnego naukowego argumentu wykonanego w artykule. Wykorzystujemy bogato kontekstualizowane uczenie się głębokiej reprezentacji wstępnie przeszkolone na korpusie domeny biomedycznej do analizy struktur dyskursu naukowego i ekstrakcji "fragmentów dowodowych" (tj. tekstu w sekcji wyników opisującej dane przedstawione w określonej podrysunku) z zestawu biomedycznych eksperymentalnych artykułów badawczych. Najpierw demonstrujemy nasz najnowocześniejszy tagger dyskursu naukowego na dwóch zbiorach danych dyskursu naukowego oraz jego możliwość przenoszenia do nowych zbiorów danych. Następnie pokazujemy korzyści z wykorzystania znaczników dyskursu naukowego do dalszych zadań, takich jak ekstrakcja roszczeń i wykrywanie fragmentów dowodów. Nasza praca pokazuje potencjał wykorzystania fragmentów dowodowych pochodzących z przedziałów rysunkowych do poprawy jakości twierdzeń naukowych poprzez katalogowanie, indeksowanie i ponowne wykorzystanie fragmentów dowodowych jako niezależnych dokumentów.', 'sr': 'Dokazi imaju ključnu ulogu u bilo kojoj biomedicinskoj istraživanju, pružajući opravdanje za neke tvrdnje i refutaciju drugima. Tražimo da izgradimo modele naučnog argumenta koristeći metode izvlačenja informacija iz punog teksta papira. Predstavljamo sposobnost automatskog izvlačenja tekstskih delimenata iz osnovnih istraživačkih papira koji opisuju dokaze koji su predstavljeni u figurima tog papira, koji se navodno pružaju sirovinu bilo kog znanstvenog argumenta napravljenog unutar papira. Primjenjujemo bogatski kontekstualizirano duboko predstavljanje učenja predobučenog na biomedicinskom domenu korpusu na analizu naučnih diskurskih struktura i izvlačenje "delimenata dokaza" (tj. teksta u sekciji rezultata koji opisuje podatke predstavljene u određenoj podfiguri) iz set a biomedicinskih eksperimentalnih istraživanja. Prvo pokazujemo našu državu naučnih diskursija o dva naučna diskursa o označavanju podataka i njenoj prebacivosti na nove podatake. Onda pokazujemo korist učinkovitosti znanstvenih znakova diskusija za sledeće zadatke kao što su izvlačenje zahteva i otkrivanje dokaza fragmenta. Naš rad pokazuje potencijal korištenja delimenata dokaza iz figura za poboljšanje kvalitete naučnih tvrdnji katalogom, indeksiranjem i ponovnom korištenjem delimenata dokaza kao nezavisnih dokumenta.', 'ro': 'Dovezile joacă un rol crucial în orice narațiune de cercetare biomedicală, oferind justificarea unor afirmații și respingerea altora. Încercăm să construim modele de argument științific folosind metode de extragere a informațiilor din lucrări full-text. Prezentăm capacitatea de extragere automată a fragmentelor text din lucrările primare de cercetare care descriu dovezile prezentate în cifrele respective, care, probabil, furnizează materia primă a oricărui argument științific făcut în cadrul lucrării. Aplicăm o învățare profundă de reprezentare bogat contextualizată pre-instruită pe corpul domeniului biomedical la analiza structurilor discursului științific și extragerea "fragmentelor de evidență" (adică textul din secțiunea rezultate care descrie datele prezentate într-o subfigură specificată) dintr-un set de articole de cercetare experimentală biomedicală. Mai întâi demonstrăm etichetatorul nostru de discurs științific de ultimă generație pe două seturi de date de etichetare a discursurilor științifice și transferabilitatea acestuia în seturi de date noi. Apoi, vom arăta beneficiul utilizării etichetelor de discurs științific pentru sarcini din aval, cum ar fi extragerea pretențiilor și detectarea fragmentelor de probe. Lucrarea noastră demonstrează potențialul utilizării fragmentelor de evidență derivate din intervale de cifre pentru îmbunătățirea calității afirmațiilor științifice prin catalogarea, indexarea și reutilizarea fragmentelor de evidență ca documente independente.', 'so': "Aqoonsiyadu waxay leedahay qayb muhiim ah oo ku saabsan taariikhda cilmiga dhakhaatiirta ah, kaas oo xaq u siiya dacwadda qaarkood iyo qaxootinta qaarkood. We seek to build models of scientific argument using information extraction methods from full-text papers.  Waxaannu awood u yeelaynaa in ay si automatic ah uga soo bixiso qoraalada baaritaanka aasaasiga ah oo sawirida caddeyaasha ay ka soo bandhigtay sawirada warqaddaas, taas oo si rasmi ah ugu muuqata macluumaad xunxun oo warqadda ku qoran. Waxaannu si weyn u codsanaynaa aqoonta aad u dheer barashada qofka lagu barto baaritaanka caafimaadka e e biotics, si aan u baaritaanno dhismaha hadalka cilmiga iyo ka soo bixino qiimaha caddeynta (tusaale ahaan xarunta kooxa ka soo qoran taariikhda taariikhda ee lagu soo qoray qoraalka baaritaanka dhakhtarka ee dhakhtarka. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu muujinnaa xaaladeena sayniska cilmiga leh oo ku qoran labada hadal cilmiga ah oo macluumaadka tagida iyo beddelinta macluumaadka cusub. Markaas waxan tusnaynaa faa'iidada u soo diritaanka alaabta hadalka cilmiga leh, tusaale ahaan baaritaanka iyo caddeynta. Shuqulkayagu wuxuu muujiyaa suurtagalka isticmaalka burburka sawirada ah oo ka soo baxay qoraalka sayniska si uu u kordhino qiimaha cilmiga ah, baaritaanka iyo dib ugu isticmaalo caddeynta sida dukumentiyada xor ah.", 'ta': "தெளிவான அத்தாட்சிகள் எந்த உயிரியல் மருத்துவ ஆராய்ச்சியிலும் முக்கியமான பங்கு வைக்கிறது, மற்றவர்களுக்கு சில கூறு நாங்கள் அறிவியலான தருமத்தின் மாதிரிகளை முழு உரை தாள்களில் இருந்து தகவல் பெறுதல் முறைகளை உருவாக்கும். நாம் தானாகவே உரை பகுதிகளை முதல் ஆய்வு தாளிலிருந்து தானாகவே வெளியேற்றுவதற்கு தானாகவே காணப்படும். அது தாளில் செய்யப்பட்ட எந்த அறிவியல் தருமதிப்பு நாம் விஞ்ஞான பேச்சு உரையாடல் அமைப்புகள் மற்றும் 'ஆதாரங்கள் பிரிவுகள்' (குறிப்பிட்ட துணைப்புகளில் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட தரவை விவரிக்கும் பிரிவுகளிலிருந்து உள்ள ஆழமான பிரதிப்புகளை பயன்படுத் We first demonstrate our state-of-the-art scientific discourse tagger on two scientific discourse tagging datasets and its transferability to new datasets.  பின்னர் நாம் அறிவியல் பேச்சு குறிகளை அனுப்புவதற்கு நன்மையை காட்டுகிறோம் நீர்வெளியீட்டு பணிகள் போன்ற தெளிவுப்ப எங்கள் வேலை சுலபமான ஆவணங்களாக அட்டவணைப்படுத்தி, அடையாளம் மற்றும் தெளிவான துண்டுகளை மேம்படுத்துவதற்காக வடிவமைப்பு துண்டுகளை பயன்படுத்தும் தெ", 'sv': 'Bevis spelar en avgörande roll i all biomedicinsk forskningsberättelse, vilket ger motivering för vissa påståenden och motbevisande för andra. Vi försöker bygga modeller av vetenskapliga argument med hjälp av informationsutvinningsmetoder från fulltextartiklar. Vi presenterar möjligheten att automatiskt extrahera textfragment från primära forskningsartiklar som beskriver bevisen som presenteras i uppsatsens siffror, vilket utan tvekan utgör råmaterialet för alla vetenskapliga argument som görs inom uppsatsen. Vi tillämpar rikligt kontextualiserad djuprepresentationsinlärning som tränats på biomedicinsk domänkorpus för analys av vetenskapliga diskursstrukturer och utvinning av "evidensfragment" (dvs. texten i resultatsektionen beskriver data som presenteras i en specificerad underfigur) från en uppsättning biomedicinsk experimentell forskningsartiklar. Först demonstrerar vi vår toppmoderna vetenskapliga diskurstaggare på två vetenskapliga diskurstaggande datauppsättningar och dess överförbarhet till nya datauppsättningar. Vi visar sedan fördelen med att utnyttja vetenskapliga diskurstaggar för efterföljande uppgifter som skadeutvinning och evidensfragmentdetektering. Vårt arbete demonstrerar potentialen med att använda evidensfragment som härrör från figurspann för att förbättra kvaliteten på vetenskapliga påståenden genom att katalogisera, indexera och återanvända evidensfragment som oberoende dokument.', 'ur': "دلیلیں ہر بیوڈیسی تحقیقات کی کہانیاں میں اہم رغم لگاتے ہیں، بعض ادعا اور دوسری ادعا کے لئے ثابت قدم رکھتے ہیں. ہم پورے ٹیکسٹ کاغذوں سے معلومات اخراج طریقے کے مطابق سمجھانے کی مدل بنانا چاہتے ہیں. ہم نے اس کاغذ کی تصاویروں میں پیش کیے ہوئے دلیل کی تعریف کرتی ہیں جو کاغذ کے اندر ہر علمی دلیل کے ذریعہ سے لکھی ہوئی روئی مواد کے ذریعہ سے استعمال کرتی ہیں۔ ہم بہت زیادہ متوجہ ہونے والی عمیق نمونات کی تعلیم کے لئے زیادہ تحصیل کی جاتی ہیں جو زیادہ تحصیل دینے والی ڈومین کورپوس پر پہلے تحصیل کی جاتی ہے، سائنس ڈیکورس کی ساختاریوں کی تحصیل اور 'دلیل فرقے' کی استخراج کی جاتی ہیں (یعنی نتیجے کے فرقے کے متوجۂ متوجۂ  ہم پہلی بار اپنے ایٹیٹ کا سائنس بحث ٹاگر کو دو سائنس ڈیٹ سٹ ٹاگر کے ذریعہ دکھاتے ہیں اور اس کی نئی ڈیٹ سٹ پر انتقال قابلیت دکھاتے ہیں پھر ہم نے دانشمندی باتوں کے ٹاگنے کے لئے فائدہ دکھائے ہیں جن کے مطابق اضافہ اور شہادت کے ٹاگنے کا ذریعہ ہے ہمارا کام دکھاتا ہے کہ تصاویر کی جگہ سے پائی ہوئی نشانیاں ٹکڑوں کا استعمال کرنا چاہیے کہ کاٹلوگ، انڈیکس کرنا اور دوبارہ دکھانے کے ٹکڑوں کو مستقل دکھانے کے ذریعہ سیاسی تعبیر کے کیفیت سے بہتر کریں۔", 'si': "සාක්ෂියක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හැම ජීවිත වෛද්\u200dය පරීක්ෂණ කතාවක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, අනිත් අයිතිය අපි හොයාගන්නේ විද්\u200dයාණික වාර්තාවක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් පාළුවන් තොරතුරු නිර්මාණය කරන් අපි ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණ කතාවලින් පැත්තක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණ කතාවල් වලින් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන අපි භාවිත විශ්වාසයෙන් විද්\u200dයාත්මක විශ්වාසයේ විද්\u200dයාත්මක විශ්වාසය සහ 'සාක්ෂික විශ්වාසය' (ඉතින්, ප්\u200dරතිකාරයේ ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් දත්ත පෙනු අපි මුලින්ම අපේ විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාත්මක කතා කරනවා විද්\u200dයාත්මක කතා කරනවා දත්ත සැට් දෙකක් ටැග් කරනවා සහ අළුත් දත්ත සැ ඊට පස්සේ අපි විද්\u200dයාත්මක කතා කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විද්\u200dයාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාවක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය අපේ වැඩේ ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා සාක්ෂික කොටස් භාවිතා කරන්න පුළුවන් සාක්ෂික කොටස් වලින් සිද්ධ විශ්වාසික ක්\u200dරමතාවක් විශේෂ", 'uz': "Hujjatlar bir necha davomida va boshqa davomida muvaffaqiyatlarni qo'shish mumkin. Biz ilmiy argumentning modellarini butun matn qoʻllangan maʼlumot uchrashuv usullarini ishlatmoqchimiz. Biz avtomatik matn qismlarini avtomatik olib tashlash imkoniyatini hozir qilamiz. Bu qogʻozdagi ilmiy argumentlarning qisqa materialini aniqlash mumkin. Biz ilmiy suhbat murakkablarini aniqlash va 'ma'lumot qismlarini ajratuvchi' tarkibini aniqlash uchun boshqa o'rganishdan oldin o'rganish qo'llanmalarni qo'llamiz. Biz birinchi esa ilmiy suhbatning holatimizning holatimizni ko'rsatdik, ikki ilmiy suhbat soʻzlari haqida yangi maʼlumotlar tarkibini ko'rsatdik. We then show the benefit of leveraging scientific discourse tags for downstream tasks such as claim-extraction and evidence fragment detection.  Bizning ishimizni saqlash, saqlash va dokumatlar sifatida qayta ishlab chiqarish, ilmiy soʻzlarining sifatini oshirish uchun rasm qismlaridan foydalanish imkoniyatini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Bằng chứng đóng vai trò quan trọng trong mọi câu chuyện về nghiên cứu sinh học, cung cấp sự bào chữa cho một số yêu cầu và bác bỏ cho người khác. Chúng tôi muốn xây dựng các mẫu tranh luận khoa học dựa trên các phương pháp trích xuất thông tin từ các văn bản đầy đủ. Chúng tôi có khả năng tự động khai thác các mảnh chữ từ các nghiên cứu s ơ cấp, miêu tả các chứng cứ được đưa ra trong các con số của tờ giấy, mà chắc chắn cung cấp nguyên liệu nguyên liệu của bất kỳ lý luận khoa học nào được đưa ra trong tờ giấy. Chúng tôi áp dụng các hình ảnh sâu sắc học về đại diện sinh học trong lĩnh vực sinh học tập kết cấu khoa học và khai thác các "các phần bằng chứng" về các cấu trúc khoa học (tức là đoạn trong phần kết quả mô tả các dữ liệu được cung cấp dưới quy định) từ một bộ nghiên cứu sinh học. Trước hết, chúng tôi chứng minh bài diễn văn khoa học hiện đại của chúng tôi về hai câu chuyện khoa học bắt dữ liệu và khả năng chuyển giao của nó cho các tập tin mới. Chúng tôi cho thấy lợi ích của việc sử dụng các thẻ ngôn luận khoa học cho các công việc xuôi dòng như khai thác và phát hiện các mảnh vụn bằng chứng. Công việc của chúng tôi cho thấy khả năng sử dụng các mảnh bằng chứng lấy từ nút áo phân tích nhằm cải thiện chất lượng của các yêu cầu khoa học bằng cách liệt kê, in và tái sử dụng các mảnh bằng chứng cứ như tài liệu độc lập.', 'bg': 'Доказателствата играят решаваща роля във всеки биомедицински изследователски разказ, като предоставят обосновка за някои твърдения и опровержение за други. Стремим се да изградим модели на научни аргументи, използвайки методи за извличане на информация от статии с пълен текст. Представяме способността за автоматично извличане на текстови фрагменти от първични научни статии, които описват доказателствата, представени в фигурите на тази статия, които несъмнено предоставят суровината на всеки научен аргумент, направен в рамките на статията. Ние прилагаме богато контекстуализирано дълбоко представително обучение, предварително обучено в биомедицински домейн корпус, за анализа на научните дискурсни структури и извличането на "фрагменти от доказателства" (т.е. текста в раздела с резултати, описващ данните, представени в определена подфигура) от набор от биомедицински експериментални статии. Първо демонстрираме нашия модерен научен дискурсен маркер върху два научен дискурс маркиращи набора от данни и неговата преносимост към нови набори от данни. След това показваме ползата от използването на маркери за научни дискурси за задачи надолу по веригата, като извличане на твърдения и откриване на фрагменти от доказателства. Нашата работа демонстрира потенциала на използването на фрагменти от доказателства, получени от фигурни интервали, за подобряване качеството на научните твърдения чрез каталогизиране, индексиране и повторно използване на фрагменти от доказателства като независими документи.', 'da': "Beviser spiller en afgørende rolle i enhver biomedicinsk forskningsfortælling, der giver begrundelse for nogle påstande og afvisning for andre. Vi søger at opbygge modeller af videnskabelige argumenter ved hjælp af informationsudvindingsmetoder fra fuldtekst papirer. Vi præsenterer muligheden for automatisk at udtrække tekstfragmenter fra primære forskningsartikler, der beskriver de beviser, der præsenteres i papirets tal, som sandsynligvis giver råmaterialet til ethvert videnskabeligt argument fremsat i papiret. Vi anvender rigt kontekstualiseret dyb repræsentationslæring forudtrænet på biomedicinsk domænekorpus til analyse af videnskabelige diskursstrukturer og udtrækning af 'evidensfragmenter' (dvs. teksten i resultatsafsnittet beskriver data præsenteret i en bestemt underfigur) fra et sæt biomedicinske eksperimentelle forskningsartikler. Vi demonstrerer først vores state-of-the-art videnskabelige diskursmærker på to videnskabelige diskursmærkende datasæt og dets overførbarhed til nye datasæt. Vi viser derefter fordelene ved at udnytte videnskabelige diskursmærker til downstream-opgaver såsom kravudveksling og evidensfragmentdetektion. Vores arbejde demonstrerer potentialet i at bruge evidensfragmenter afledt fra figurspænder til at forbedre kvaliteten af videnskabelige påstande ved at katalogisere, indeksere og genbruge evidensfragmenter som uafhængige dokumenter.", 'hr': 'Dokazi imaju ključnu ulogu u bilo kojoj biomedicinskoj istraživanju, pružajući opravdanje za neke tvrdnje i odbijanje drugima. Pokušavamo izgraditi modele znanstvenih argumenata koristeći metode izvlačenja informacija iz punog teksta papira. Predstavljamo sposobnost automatskog izvlačenja tekstskih dijelova iz osnovnih istraživačkih papira koji opisuju dokaze koji su predstavljeni u podacima tog papira, koji se navodno pružaju sirovinu bilo kojeg znanstvenog argumenta napravljenog unutar papira. Primjenjujemo bogatim kontekstualiziranim dubokim predstavljanjem učenja predobučenog na biomedicinskom domenu korpusu na analizu struktura znanstvenih diskursa i izvlačenje "fragmenta dokaza" (tj. teksta u sekciji rezultata opisujući podatke predstavljene u određenoj podfiguri) iz skupa biomedicinskih eksperimentalnih istraživačkih članaka. Prvo pokazujemo našu državu umjetnosti znanstvenih diskursija o dvije naučne diskursije označavanju podataka i njenoj prebacivosti na nove podatake. Onda pokazujemo korist učinkovitosti znanstvenih znakova diskusija za spuštene zadatke poput izvlačenja zahtjeva i otkrivanja dokaza fragmenta. Naš rad pokazuje potencijal korištenja dijelova dokaza iz figura za poboljšanje kvalitete znanstvenih zahtjeva katalogom, indeksiranjem i ponovnom upotrebom dijelova dokaza kao nezavisnih dokumenata.', 'nl': "Bewijs speelt een cruciale rol in elk biomedisch onderzoeksverhaal, het verstrekken van rechtvaardiging voor sommige beweringen en weerlegging voor andere. We proberen modellen van wetenschappelijke argumenten te bouwen met behulp van informatieextractiemethoden uit full-text papers. We presenteren de mogelijkheid om automatisch tekstfragmenten uit primaire onderzoekspapers te extraheren die het bewijs beschrijven dat in de cijfers van dat document wordt gepresenteerd, wat waarschijnlijk de grondstof vormt van elk wetenschappelijk argument dat in het document wordt gemaakt. We passen rijkelijk contextualiseerd deep representation learning toe, voorgetraind op biomedisch domein corpus, op de analyse van wetenschappelijke discoursstructuren en de extractie van 'bewijsfragmenten' (d.w.z. de tekst in de resultatensectie die gegevens beschrijft gepresenteerd in een gespecificeerde subfiguur) uit een reeks biomedisch experimenteel onderzoeksartikelen. We demonstreren eerst onze state-of-the-art wetenschappelijke discours tagger op twee wetenschappelijke discours tagging datasets en de overdraagbaarheid ervan naar nieuwe datasets. Vervolgens tonen we het voordeel van het inzetten van wetenschappelijke discourstags voor downstreamtaken zoals claimextractie en detectie van bewijsfragmenten. Ons werk demonstreert het potentieel van het gebruik van bewijsfragmenten afgeleid van cijferspannen om de kwaliteit van wetenschappelijke claims te verbeteren door bewijsfragmenten te catalogiseren, indexeren en hergebruiken als onafhankelijke documenten.", 'de': 'Evidenz spielt eine entscheidende Rolle in jeder biomedizinischen Forschung Erzählung und liefert Rechtfertigung für einige Behauptungen und Widerlegung für andere. Wir versuchen Modelle wissenschaftlicher Argumentation mit Methoden der Informationsextraktion aus Volltextpapieren zu erstellen. Wir präsentieren die Fähigkeit, Textfragmente automatisch aus primären Forschungsarbeiten zu extrahieren, die die Beweise beschreiben, die in den Abbildungen dieses Papiers präsentiert werden, was wohl den Rohstoff für jedes wissenschaftliche Argument liefert, das innerhalb des Papiers vorgebracht wird. Wir wenden reich kontextualisiertes Deep Repräsentation Learning an, das auf biomedizinischen Domänenkorpus vortrainiert wurde, zur Analyse wissenschaftlicher Diskursstrukturen und zur Extraktion von "Beweisfragmenten" (d.h. dem Text im Ergebnisabschnitt, der Daten beschreibt, die in einer bestimmten Unterfigur präsentiert werden) aus einer Reihe von biomedizinischen experimentellen Forschungsartikeln an. Zunächst demonstrieren wir unseren modernen wissenschaftlichen Diskurs-Tagger an zwei wissenschaftlichen Diskurs-Tagging-Datensätzen und seine Übertragbarkeit auf neue Datensätze. Anschließend zeigen wir den Nutzen der Nutzung wissenschaftlicher Diskurstags für nachgelagerte Aufgaben wie Claim-Extraktion und Beweisfragment-Erkennung auf. Unsere Arbeit demonstriert das Potenzial der Verwendung von Beweisfragmenten aus Figurenspannen zur Verbesserung der Qualität wissenschaftlicher Behauptungen durch Katalogisierung, Indizierung und Wiederverwendung von Beweisfragmenten als unabhängige Dokumente.', 'id': "Bukti bermain peran penting dalam cerita penelitian biomedis apapun, menyediakan alasan untuk beberapa klaim dan refutasi untuk yang lain. Kami berusaha membangun model argumen ilmiah menggunakan metode ekstraksi informasi dari kertas teks penuh. Kami mempersembahkan kemampuan untuk secara otomatis mengekstraksi fragmen teks dari kertas penelitian utama yang menjelaskan bukti yang dipaparkan dalam angka kertas itu, yang mungkin menyediakan bahan mentah dari setiap argumen ilmiah yang dibuat dalam kertas. Kami menerapkan persembahan mendalam yang sangat kontekstualisasi belajar prapelatih di domain biomedis corpus untuk analisis struktur diskors ilmiah dan ekstraksi 'fragmen bukti' (i.e., teks di bagian hasil yang menjelaskan data yang ditetapkan dalam subfigura tertentu) dari set artikel penelitian eksperimental biomedis. We first demonstrate our state-of-the-art scientific discourse tagger on two scientific discourse tagging datasets and its transferability to new datasets.  Kemudian kita menunjukkan keuntungan dari menggunakan tags diskors ilmiah untuk tugas turun seperti claim-extraction dan deteksi fragment bukti. Pekerjaan kami menunjukkan potensi menggunakan fragmen bukti yang berasal dari jangkauan angka untuk meningkatkan kualitas klaim ilmiah dengan mengkatalogi, mengindeks dan menggunakan kembali fragmen bukti sebagai dokumen independen.", 'fa': 'مدرک یک نقش مهم در هر داستان تحقیقات بیولوژیک بازی می\u200cکند، که برای بعضی از ادعا و تأخیر برای دیگران ثابت می\u200cکند. ما تلاش می\u200cکنیم مدل\u200cهای حجت علمی را با استفاده از روش\u200cهای استخراج اطلاعات از کاغذهای کامل متن بسازیم. ما توانایی استخراج پاره\u200cهای متن را از روزنامه\u200cهای اصلی تحقیقات می\u200cکنیم که مدرک\u200cهای توصیف شده در نقشه\u200cهای آن کاغذ را توصیف می\u200cکنند، که به طور دلیل ماده\u200cهای طبیعی هر دلیل علمی که توسط کاغذ ساخته می\u200cشود، به طور خود ما از طریق یک مجموعه از مطالعه\u200cهای تحقیقات بیولوژیک تحقیقات تحقیقات تحقیقات تحقیقات تحقیقات عمیق تحقیقات عمیق را برای تحقیقات داده\u200cایم. ما اولین بار نشان می دهیم که نقشه\u200cهای علمی در دو صحبت علمی با نقشه\u200cهای داده\u200cها و قابلیت انتقال آن به مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای جدید نشان می\u200cدهیم. سپس سودی را به تأثیر گفتگوهای علمی برای کارهای پایین، مانند استخراج و شناسایی شهادت، نشان می دهیم. کارمون پتانسیل استفاده از قطعه\u200cهای مدرک\u200cها که از مدرک\u200cهای تصویر به عنوان مدرک\u200cهای مستقل به عنوان مدرک\u200cهای مستقل به بهترین کیفیت ادعا علمی از طریق کاتالوژی، نشان داده می\u200cشود.', 'ko': "증거는 모든 생물의학 연구 서사에서 중요한 역할을 하며, 어떤 견해에 정당한 이유를 제공하고, 다른 견해에 반박을 제공한다.우리는 전문 논문에서 정보를 추출하는 방법을 이용하여 과학적 논증의 모델을 구축하고자 한다.우리는 주요 연구 논문에서 텍스트 부분을 자동으로 추출하는 능력을 보여 주었다. 이런 텍스트 부분은 논문 데이터에 나타난 증거를 묘사하고 이러한 데이터는 논문 중의 어떠한 과학적 논증에도 원시 자료를 제공했다고 할 수 있다.우리는 생물의학 분야의 어료 라이브러리에서 미리 훈련한 풍부한 어경화 심도 표징 학습을 과학적 언어 구조를 분석하는 데 응용하고 생물의학 실험 연구 문장에서'증거 부분'(즉 결과 부분에서 특정한 하위 도면의 데이터를 묘사한 텍스트)을 추출할 것이다.우리는 먼저 두 개의 과학 문장 표기 데이터 집합에서 우리의 가장 선진적인 과학 문장 표기기와 새로운 데이터 집합에서의 이동성을 보여 주었다.그리고 우리는 클레임 추출과 증거 단편 검측 등 과학적 언어 라벨을 이용하여 하류 임무를 수행하는 장점을 보여 주었다.우리의 작업은 증거 부분을 독립된 문서로 분류하고 색인하며 중용함으로써 그림의 경계에서 추출한 증거 부분을 사용하여 과학 주장의 질을 향상시키는 것이 잠재력이 있다는 것을 보여준다.", 'af': "Die getuienisse speel 'n belangrike rol in enige biomediese ondersoek verklaratiewe, verskaf regverdigheid vir sommige aansoek en verwerking vir ander. Ons soek om modele van wetenskaplike argument te bou deur inligting uittrek metodes van volle teks papier te gebruik. Ons stel die moontlikheid van automaties uitpak teks fragmente van primêre forskingpapier wat die bevestigheid wat in daardie papier se figure voorgeskryf is, wat waarskynlik die raai materiël van enige wetenskaplike argument binne die papier verskaf word. Ons wend regtig contextualiseerde diep verteenwoordigheid om vooraf-opgeleer te leer op biomediese domein korpus na die analiseer van wetenskaplike diskurse strukture en die uitpakking van 'bevestige fragmente' (i.e. die teks in die resultate artikel beskrywing van data voorgeskryf in 'n gespesifiseerde subfiguur) van' n stel van biomediese eksperimentale reseksie artikels. Ons wys eerste ons status-of-the-art wetenskaplike diskursie merker op twee wetenskaplike diskursie merking datastelle en sy oordragbaarheid na nuwe datastelle. Ons wys dan die voordeel van die verwysing van wetenskaplike diskursie etikette vir onderstreem opdragte soos aandrukking-uittrekking en bevestigheidfragment-optrekking. Ons werk bevestig die potensieal van gebruik van bevestigheidfragmente wat van figuur spans afgelei is om die kwaliteit van wetenskaplike aansoek te verbeter deur katalogeer, indeksering en hergebruik van bevestigheidfragmente as onafhanklike dokumente.", 'sw': 'Uthibitisho unafanya jukumu muhimu katika simulizi yoyote ya utafiti wa kitabibu, na kutoa haki kwa baadhi ya madai na wakimbizi kwa wengine. Tunataka kutengeneza mifano ya hoja ya kisayansi kwa kutumia njia za utekelezaji wa habari kutoka kwenye karatasi kamili za maandishi. Tunaweza kuweka uwezo wa kutengeneza vipande vya maandishi kutoka kwenye karatasi za utafiti wa msingi ambazo vinaelezea ushahidi uliotolewa katika takwimu za gazeti hilo, ambazo zinahoji kuwa ni vifaa vibaya vya mazungumzo yoyote ya kisayansi yaliyofanywa ndani ya gazeti hilo. Tunatumia uwakilishi wa kina wenye utaratibu mkubwa wa kujifunza mafunzo ya kabla ya kufundisha makampuni ya ndani ya kitabibu kwa uchambuzi wa miundombinu ya mazungumzo ya kisayansi na utoaji wa vipande vya ushahidi (yaani, maandishi ya vipande vya matokeo kinachoelezea taarifa zilizowekwa katika kipindi fulani cha utafiti wa kitabibu. Kwanza tunaonyesha mwandishi wetu wa mazungumzo ya kisayansi ya sanaa kuhusu seti mbili za mazungumzo ya kisayansi na kubadilishwa kwa taarifa mpya. Kisha tunaonyesha faida ya kutumia viungo vya mazungumzo ya kisayansi kwa kazi za mito kama vile vile kutengenezwa kwa madai na kuchunguzwa kwa ushahidi. Kazi zetu zinaonyesha uwezekano wa kutumia vipande vya ushahidi vilivyotokana na vipande vya picha kwa ajili ya kuboresha kiwango cha madai ya kisayansi kwa kuchuja, kuchuja na kutumia vipande vya ushahidi kama nyaraka huru.', 'sq': "Provat luajnë një rol vendimtar në çdo tregim të kërkimit biomedical, duke ofruar justifikim për disa pretendime dhe refuzim për të tjerët. Ne kërkojmë të ndërtojmë modele të argumenteve shkencore duke përdorur metodat e nxjerrjes së informacionit nga letrat me tekst të plotë. We present the capability of automatically extracting text fragments from primary research papers that describe the evidence presented in that paper's figures, which arguably provides the raw material of any scientific argument made within the paper.  Ne aplikojmë përfaqësim të thellë të pasur kontekstualizuar mësim të paratrajnuar në domenin biomedical corpus në analizën e strukturave shkencore të diskursit dhe nxjerrjen e 'fragmenteve të provave' (që do të thotë, teksti në seksionin e rezultateve që përshkruan të dhënat e paraqitura në një nënfigurë të caktuar) nga një sërë artikujsh të kërkimit biomedikal eksperimental. Së pari demonstrojmë etiketën tonë të diskursit shkencor më të avancuar në dy grupe të dhënash shkencor me etiketë diskursi dhe transferueshmërinë e tij në grupe të reja të dhënash. Pastaj tregojmë përfitimin e përdorimit të etiketave shkencore të diskursit për detyrat më poshtë të tilla si nxjerrja e pretendimeve dhe zbulimi i fragmenteve të provave. Puna jonë demonstron potencialin e përdorimit të fragmenteve të provave të nxjerra nga shifrat për përmirësimin e cilësisë së pretendimeve shkencore duke kataloguar, indeksuar dhe përdorur përsëri fragmentet e provave si dokumente të pavarura.", 'am': 'Evidence plays a crucial role in any biomedical research narrative, providing justification for some claims and refutation for others.  የሳይንቀሳዊ ክርክር ምሳሌዎችን ከመሙሉ የጽሑፍ ገጾች የመውሰጥ ጥናት እናደርጋለን፡፡ የጽሑፉን ቁራጮች በመጀመሪያው ትምህርት ገጾች ውስጥ የተገኘውን ማስረጃዎችን በሚያሳየው የሕንፃዊ አካባቢዎች የጽሑፉን ክፍሎች አውጥተናል፡፡ በbiomedical domain ካርፓስ ላይ በተማረ ጥልቅ መልዕክት እና የሳይንቀሳዊ ንግግር ግንኙነት አካባቢዎችን እና “ምስክር ቍራጮችን” በማስተካከል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ የመጀመሪያ የሳይንቀሳዊ ንግግር ጋግሬን በሁለት የሳይንቀሳዊ ንግግር ዳታዎችን እና አዲስ ዳታዎችን ለመለወጥ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ ከዚያም በኋላ የሳይንስ ንግግር ምልክቶችን ለመስጠት ጥቅማችን እና የመረጃ ግንኙነት እና ማስረጃዎችን ለማግኘት እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ ሥራችን የሳይንቀሳዊ ጥያቄዎችን አካባቢ፣ ጥያቄ እና ማስረጃዎችን እንደ ነፃ ሰነድ በማድረግ እና በመጠቀም የሚችሉትን ማስረጃዎች ከፎንክ ክፍል የተደረገውን ማስረጃ ማድረግ ያስታያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Հապացույցները կարևոր դեր են խաղում ցանկացած կենսաբժշկական հետազոտության պատմության մեջ, ապահովում են արդարացում որոշ փաստարկների համար և ուրիշների համար մերժում: Մենք փորձում ենք կառուցել գիտական բանավեճի մոդելներ օգտագործելով տեղեկատվության հանման մեթոդներ ամբողջ տեքստի թղթերից: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք հնարավորությունը ավտոմատ հանել տեքստի կտորներ հիմնական հետազոտական փաստաթղթերից, որոնք նկարագրում են այդ փաստաթղթի թվերում ներկայացված ապացույցները, որոնք հավանաբար ապահովում են ցանկացած գիտական փաստարկման աղբյուր: Մենք օգտագործում ենք հարուստ կոնտեքստալիզացված խորը ներկայացուցիչ ուսումնասիրությունը, որը նախապատրաստված է կենսաբժշկական ոլորտում կորպոս ուսումնասիրելու համար գիտական խոսակցության կառուցվածքների վերլուծության և ապացույցների բաժանների (այսինքն, արդյունքների բաժանի տեքստը, որը նկարագրում է տվյալները,  We first demonstrate our state-of-the-art scientific discourse tagger on two scientific discourse tagging datasets and its transferability to new datasets.  We then show the benefit of leveraging scientific discourse tags for downstream tasks such as claim-extraction and evidence fragment detection.  Մեր աշխատանքը ցույց է տալիս ապացույցների բաժանվածքների օգտագործման պոտենցիալը՝ անկախ փաստաթղթերով, կատալոգի, ինդեքսի և վերաօգտագործելու միջոցով, գիտական փաստաթղթերի որակը բարելավելու համար:', 'bn': "প্রমাণ কোন বায়োমেডিকেল গবেষণার কাহিনীতে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভূমিকা প্রদর্শন করে, যা কিছু দাবি এবং অন্যদের জন্য আশ্রয় প্রদান কর আমরা বৈজ্ঞানিক যুক্তির মডেল তৈরি করতে চাই পুরো টেক্সট পাতায় তথ্য বের করার পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করে। আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্রথম গবেষণা কাগজ থেকে টেক্সটের ভাঙ্গা বের করার ক্ষমতা উপস্থাপন করেছি যা প্রকাশিত প্রমাণের বর্ণনা করেছে, যা যুক্তি যুক্তি  বায়োমেডিকেল ডোমেইন কোর্পাসের উপর প্রশিক্ষণ পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষণ শিক্ষা প্রদান করা গভীর প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রয়োগ করে বৈজ্ঞানিক কথোপকথন কাঠামোর বিশ্লেষণ এবং 'প্রমাণ বিভিন্ন সংক্রান্ত বিভিন্ন আমরা প্রথম দুই বিজ্ঞানিক কথোপকথন ট্যাগিং ডাটাসেটের উপর আমাদের রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের বৈজ্ঞানিক কথোপকথন ট্যাগার প্রদর্শন করি  তারপর আমরা বিজ্ঞানিক কথোপকথন ট্যাগ প্রদান করি নিচে নিচে যাওয়ার জন্য বিজ্ঞানিক কথোপকথন ট্যাগ প্রদান করার সুবিধা দেখাই য আমাদের কাজ দেখাচ্ছে স্বাধীন নথি হিসেবে প্রমাণ ব্যবহার করার মাধ্যমে স্বাধীন নথিপত্র হিসেবে পুনরায় বিজ্ঞানিক দাবীর মান উন্নত করার কারণে প্", 'az': "Hər bir biomedical araştırma hekayəsində dəlillər çox möhkəm rol oynayır, bəzi iddiaları və başqalarına dəyişiklik verər. Biz bütün mətn kağıtlarından məlumat ekstraksiyası metodlarını istifadə edərək elmi arqümanın modellerini inşa etmək istəyirik. Biz bu kağıdın nümunələrində göstərilən dəlilləri təsdiqləyən ilk araştırma kağıtlarından mətn parçalarını avtomatik əlavə etmək bacarığımızı göstəririk. Bu belə ki, kağıdın içində yapılan hər bir bilimsel argument in s ümük materyalını təsdiqləyir. Biz bilimsel diskursal yapılarının analizi və 'dəlil parçalarının' çəkilməsini ( məsələlərin sonuçlarında müəyyən edilmiş subfigurada verilən məlumatları təsdiqləyən məlumatların məlumatlarını təsdiqlənməsi üçün çox müxtəlif təsdiqlənməsi üçün öyrəndiyimiz nümunələri təmin edirik). Biz ilk dəfə məlumatları etiketləmək və yeni veri qurularına daşınabiliyyətimizi göstərdik. Sonra da elmi söhbətlərin etiketlərini aşağı yüksək işlər üçün istifadə edirik, çünki istifadə etmək və dəlil parçalarını keçmək üçün istifadə edirik. Çalışmalarımız belə göstərir ki, qüvvətli dökümlər kimi dəlil parçalarını catalog, indeksiya və yenidən istifadə etmək üçün dəlil parçalarını nümunələrindən yaratdığı dəlil parçalarını təmizləndirir.", 'cs': 'Důkazy hrají klíčovou roli v jakémkoliv biomedicínském výzkumném vyprávění, poskytují odůvodnění některých tvrzení a vyvrácení pro jiné. Snažíme se vytvořit modely vědecké argumentace pomocí metod extrakce informací z fulltextových příspěvků. Představujeme schopnost automatického extrahování textových fragmentů z primárních výzkumných článků, které popisují důkazy prezentované v obrázkách tohoto článku, které pravděpodobně poskytují surovinu pro všechny vědecké argumenty v rámci článku. Bohatě kontextualizované hluboké reprezentační učení předškolené na korpusu biomedicínské domény aplikujeme na analýzu vědeckých diskurzních struktur a extrakci "důkazních fragmentů" (tj. textu ve výsledkové sekci popisujících data prezentovaná v určitém podobrázku) ze souboru biomedicínských experimentálních výzkumných článků. Nejprve demonstrujeme náš state-of-the-art vědecký diskurzní tagger na dvou vědeckých diskurzních tagovacích datových sadách a jeho přenositelnost na nové datové sady. Poté ukazujeme výhody využití značek vědeckého diskurzu pro následné úkoly, jako je extrakce tvrzení a detekce fragmentů důkazů. Naše práce ukazuje potenciál využití důkazních fragmentů odvozených z obrázkových rozpětí pro zlepšení kvality vědeckých tvrzení katalogizací, indexováním a opětovným využitím důkazních fragmentů jako samostatných dokumentů.', 'et': 'Tõendid mängivad olulist rolli igas biomeditsiinilises uuringute narratiivis, pakkudes põhjendusi mõnedele väidetele ja teistele ümber lükkamist. Püüame luua teadusliku argumendi mudeleid, kasutades täisteksti dokumentidest informatsiooni väljavõtmise meetodeid. Esitame võimalust automaatselt ekstraheerida tekstifragmente esmastest uurimistöödest, mis kirjeldavad selle töö numbrites esitatud tõendeid, mis väidetavalt annavad tooraine mis tahes teaduslikule argumendile, mis on esitatud töös. Biomeditsiinilisel domeenikorpusel eelnevalt koolitatud rikkalikult kontekstualiseeritud sügavrepresentatsiooniõpet rakendame teaduslike diskursuse struktuuride analüüsimiseks ja "tõendifragmentide" väljavõtmiseks (st tulemuste jaotise tekst, mis kirjeldab konkreetses alamjoonis esitatud andmeid) biomeditsiiniliste eksperimentaalsete uuringute artiklite kogumist. Esiteks demonstreerime oma tipptasemel teadusliku diskursuse sildistajat kahel teaduslikul diskursuse sildistamisel ja selle ülekantavusel uutesse andmekogumitesse. Seejärel näitame, kui kasulik on teaduslike diskursuse märgiste kasutamine järgnevate ülesannete jaoks, nagu väidete väljavõtmine ja tõendite fragmentide tuvastamine. Meie töö näitab, kui võimalik on kasutada tõendusmaterjalidest tulenevaid tõendusmaterjale teaduslike väidete kvaliteedi parandamiseks, kataloogides, indekseerides ja taaskasutades tõendusmaterjale sõltumatute dokumentidena.', 'ca': "Les proves juguen un paper crucial en qualsevol narrativa de recerca biomèdica, proporcionant justificació per algunes afirmacions i refutació per altres. Busquem construir models d'arguments científics fent servir mètodes d'extracció d'informació dels articles amb text complet. We present the capability of automatically extracting text fragments from primary research papers that describe the evidence presented in that paper's figures, which arguably provides the raw material of any scientific argument made within the paper.  We apply richly contextualized deep representation learning pre-trained on biomedical domain corpus to the analysis of scientific discourse structures and the extraction of 'evidence fragments' (i.e., the text in the results section describing data presented in a specified subfigure) from a set of biomedical experimental research articles.  Primer demostrem el nostre etiquetador científic de discurs més avançat en dos conjunts de dades d'etiqueta científica de discurs i la seva transferibilitat a nous conjunts de dades. Llavors demostram el benefici d'utilitzar etiquetes científices de discurs per a tasques avall, com la reclamació-extracció i la detecció de fragments d'evidència. La nostra feina demostra el potencial d'utilitzar fragments d'evidència derivats de la gamma de figures per millorar la qualitat de les reclamacions científices catalogant, indexant i reutilitzant fragments d'evidència com documents independents.", 'fi': 'Todisteella on ratkaiseva rooli missä tahansa biolääketieteellisessä tutkimuskertomuksessa, joka tarjoaa perusteluja joillekin väitteille ja kumoaa toiset. Pyrimme rakentamaan tieteellisen argumentin malleja käyttäen tiedonhankintamenetelmiä kokotekstipapereista. Esitämme kyvyn poimia automaattisesti tekstifragmentteja primaaritutkimuksista, jotka kuvaavat kyseisen artikkelin luvuissa esitettyä näyttöä, mikä todennäköisesti tarjoaa raaka-aineen minkä tahansa tieteellisen argumentin sisällä. Hyödynnämme runsaasti kontekstualisoitua syvän representaation oppimista, joka on esikoulutettu biolääketieteen domain corpuksella, tieteellisten diskurssirakenteiden analysointiin ja todistefragmenttien (eli tulososion tekstin, joka kuvaa tietyssä alikuvassa esitettyä tietoa) poimimiseen biolääketieteen kokeellisen tutkimuksen artikkeleista. Ensin esittelemme uusimman tieteellisen diskurssitunnisteemme kahden tieteellisen diskurssitunnisteen avulla ja sen siirrettävyyden uusiin aineistoihin. Tämän jälkeen näytämme hyödyn tieteellisten diskurssitunnisteiden hyödyntämisestä loppupään tehtävissä, kuten väitteiden poimimisessa ja todisteiden fragmenttien havaitsemisessa. Työssämme osoitetaan, että kuva-alueista johdettujen todistusfragmenttien avulla voidaan parantaa tieteellisten väitteiden laatua luetteloimalla, indeksoimalla ja käyttämällä todistusfragmentteja uudelleen itsenäisinä asiakirjoina.', 'tr': "Evidence plays an important role in any biomedical research narrative, providing justification for some claims and refutation for others. Biz bilim argümatyň nusgalaryny doly metin kagyzyndan daşary çykarma yöntemlerini ulanarak gurmak isleýäris. Biz esasy tarapyndan ilkinji araştyrma kagytlaryndan özüni özünden aýryp bilmegi mümkin edýäris. Bu kagyzyň suratynda ýazylan bilim guramynyň haty hasaplanýar. Biz bilim diskusiýa çykyş düzgünlerini we 'kanıt parçalarynyň' çykyşynyň (diýmek bolsa bir subfigurada ýazylan maglumatlary) bilen özüni öňünden öňünden öňünden öňünden öňünden öwrenmegi taýýarlapdyk. Ilkinji gezek bilim gürrüňlerimizi 2 bilim gürrüňlerde etitlendirmek we onuň täze veri setirlere taýýarlanabiligini görkezip Sonra bilim diskusiýasyny taýýarlamak üçin täsirli tägleri ýüklemegini görkezip otyrýarys. Çalışmalarymyz şekiller boşluklarını ýüzeltmek, bilim iddialeriniň kalitesini kataloglaşdyrmak, indeksizlik we şahit parçalarını täzeden döküşürmek üçin şekiller boşluklarını ulanmak mümkinçiligini görkeýär.", 'bs': 'Dokazi imaju ključnu ulogu u bilo kojoj biomedicinskoj istraživanju, pružajući opravdanje za neke tvrdnje i odbijanje drugima. Pokušavamo izgraditi modele naučnog argumenta koristeći metode izvlačenja informacija iz punog teksta papira. Predstavljamo sposobnost automatskog izvlačenja tekstskih dijelova iz osnovnih istraživačkih papira koji opisuju dokaze koji su predstavljeni u podacima tog papira, koji se navodno pružaju sirovinu bilo kog znanstvenog argumenta koji je napravljen u novinama. Primjenjujemo bogatski kontekstualizirano duboko predstavljanje učenja predobučenog na biomedicinskom domenu korpusu na analizu naučnih diskurskih struktura i izvlačenje "fragmenta dokaza" (tj. teksta u sekciji rezultata koji opisuje podatke predstavljene u određenoj podfiguri) iz skupa biomedicinskih eksperimentalnih istraživačkih članaka. Prvo pokazujemo našu nacionalnu naučnu diskusiju o dva naučna diskusija o označavanju podataka i njenoj prebacivosti na nove podatake. Zatim pokazujemo korist učinkovitosti znanstvenih znakova govora za sledeće zadatke poput izvlačenja zahtjeva i otkrivanja dokaza. Naš rad pokazuje potencijal korištenja delimenata dokaza iz figura za poboljšanje kvalitete naučnih tvrdnja katalogom, indeksiranjem i ponovnom upotrebom delimenata dokaza kao nezavisnih dokumenata.', 'jv': 'Delahan hukum sing dibenalke kelas barang nggawe barang bisa dumateng, iso nggawe justification kanggo perkaran winih lan nggawe barang kanggo terus alih. Awak dhéwé nggawe model sing sampeyan akeh dumaten tentang nggawe informasi extration method from full-text paper Awak dhéwé éntuk kapan ijol-ijol sing perusahaan kelas nang pitik nggambar cara-itik sing nyimpen winih dhéwé nggawe barang nggawe barang dhéwé, ndéwé ngomong sapa nyimpen cara-itik sing paling apik dhéwé. We aplike rikly contextual deep representation Learning before-cured on biyoproted domain Body Awake dhéwé mbêng ngomong nik kabèh-kalungsing sing siyennik kuwi tindang kuwi iki dadi, nik titimbang dataset karo nggawe dataset sing dibutungane dhéwé Awak dhéwé iso nglanggar aturan luwih-luwih dumadhi nggawe gerakan kanggo ngilanggar nggawe barang kejahatan Awak dhéwé aréwé éntuk perusahaan nggambar apa-apa sing paling nggambar cara-apa kanggo nggawe kalitas urang Sayensi kebebasan cara-suaraning, indeksi lan ngawehi nggawe dokumen sing wis ngawehi.', 'ha': "Dakata bayani na player wani muhimu a cikin wani lãbãrin littafin da aka haife shi, kuma yana da justification ga wasu madaidaita da refu da wasu. Munã nufin mu samar da misãlai na jayayin da ake yi amfani da shiryoyin cire daga takardar-matsayi cikakken. Tuna halatar da awon a farat ta fitar filin littãfi daga takardar littafan da aka rubũta ta farko, wanda ke bayyana hujjar da aka bãyar da shi a cikin takardar takardan, wanda ke yi daidai da shi, yana samar da abun duk takardan da aka samar da shi a cikin takardan. Tuna amfani da muhimmanci mai zura a matsayin da aka sanar da shi a gabã ɗaya da aka yi amfani da shi a kan makarantar da aka yi wa aikin littafin da aka sani, dõmin a yi anayyar wa masu maganar da masu zance da kuma fizgi da 'takardar bayanin' (misali, matsayin cikin rabo da data wanda aka bãyar da cikin wani subsiff) daga wasu takardar fitina na na ƙarami. Kayyan da Muke nuna halinmu-da-sanar maganar da aka sanar da masu sakin da aka yi matarwa a kan danne biyu masu sayansi da ake samu da matabbatarta zuwa dane-dane-yanzu. We then show the benefit of leveraging scientific discourse tags for downstream tasks such as claim-extraction and evidence fragment detection.  Kayinmu ya nuna awon ya yi amfani da takardar bayani wanda aka samu daga matsayin kwanan ya gyãra sifar da matsayin yaƙin da aka lissafa, yin kashi da kuma ya yi amfani da takardar shaidu kamar takardar takardar da ba'a koma ba.", 'he': "הראיות משחקות תפקיד קריטי בכל סיפור מחקר ביולורפואי, מספק הוצדקה לכמה טענות וסרב לאחרים. We seek to build models of scientific argument using information extraction methods from full-text papers.  אנו מציגים את היכולת להוציא באופן אוטומטי חתיכות טקסט מסמכי מחקר ראשיים שמתארים את הראיות המוצגות בדמות של הנייר הזה, אשר בטח מספק את החומר הראשי של כל טיעון מדעי שנעשה בתוך הנייר. אנו משתמשים ביציגה עמוקה ומתוקפת באופן עשיר ללמוד מוכשר מראש על קורפוס בתחום ביולורפואי לניתוח של מבני דיבור מדעי והוציאה של 'חתיכות ראיות' (כלומר, הטקסט בחלק התוצאות שמתאר נתונים מוצגים בתא-דמות מוגדרת) ממערכת מאמרים ניסויים ביולורפואיים. ראשית אנחנו מראים את התייחס המדעי המוקדם ביותר שלנו על שני התייחסים מדעיים מתייחסים לתייחסים ומעבירתו לקבוצות נתונים חדשות. ואז אנחנו מראים את היתרון של השימוש בתגים מדעיים לדיווח למשימות מתחתיות כמו חיפוש-תביעה וגילוי חתיכות ראיות. העבודה שלנו מראה את הפוטנציאל של השימוש בחלקי ראיות שנוצאים ממרחקי דמות לשפר את איכות הטענות המדעיות על ידי הקטלוגיה, אינדיקסים ושימוש מחדש בחלקי ראיות כמסמכים עצמאיים.", 'bo': "Evidence plays a crucial role in any biomedical research narrative, providing justification for some claims and refutation for others. We seek to build models of scientific argument using information extraction methods from full-text papers. We present the ability of automatically extracting text fragments from primary research paper s that describe the evidence presented in that paper's figures, which arguably provides the raw material of any scientific argument made within the paper. We apply richly contextualized deep representation learning pre-trained on biomedical domain corpus to the analysis of scientific discourse structures and the extraction of 'evidence fragments' (i.e., the text in the results section describing data presented in a specified subfigure) from a set of biomedical experimental research articles. ང་ཚོས་དང་པོ་ནས་དབྱིབས་གནས་སྟངས་དང་ལུགས་པའི་ཚན་རིག་གྱི་ཤོག་ལེབ་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པའི་བརྡ་སྟོན་དང་། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་ལྟ་བུའི་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་གཟུགས་རིས་བཅས་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཞིག་དང་།", 'sk': 'Dokazi igrajo ključno vlogo v vsaki biomedicinski raziskovalni pripovedi, saj zagotavljajo utemeljitev nekaterih trditev in zavračanje drugih. Prizadevamo si graditi modele znanstvenih argumentov z uporabo metod pridobivanja informacij iz celotnih besedilnih člankov. Predstavljamo zmožnost avtomatičnega ekstrakcije besedilnih fragmentov iz primarnih raziskovalnih člankov, ki opisujejo dokaze, predstavljene v številkah tega članka, kar verjetno zagotavlja surovino vseh znanstvenih argumentov znotraj članka. Za analizo znanstvenih diskurznih struktur in ekstrakcijo "fragmentov dokazov" (tj. besedila v oddelku rezultatov, ki opisuje podatke, predstavljene v določeni podfiguri), uporabljamo bogato kontekstualizirano globoko reprezentacijsko učenje, predhodno usposobljeno na biomedicinskem domenskem korpusu. Najprej predstavimo naš najsodobnejši znanstveni označevalnik diskurza na dveh znanstvenih označevalnih naborih podatkov in njegovo prenosljivost v nove nabore podatkov. Nato pokažemo korist izkoriščanja znanstvenih diskurzivnih oznak za nadaljnje naloge, kot so pridobivanje trditev in odkrivanje drobcev dokazov. Naše delo dokazuje potencial uporabe dokaznih fragmentov iz slikovnih razponov za izboljšanje kakovosti znanstvenih trditev s katalogizacijo, indeksiranjem in ponovno uporabo dokaznih fragmentov kot neodvisnih dokumentov.'}
{'en': 'StructSum : Summarization via Structured Representations', 'ar': 'مجموع الهيكل: التلخيص عبر التمثيلات المنظمة', 'fr': 'StructSum\xa0: Synthèse via des représentations structurées', 'es': 'StructSum: resumen mediante representaciones estructuradas', 'pt': 'StructSum: sumarização por meio de representações estruturadas', 'ja': 'StructSum ：構造化表現による要約', 'zh': '结构图:结构化总之', 'hi': 'StructSum: संरचित अभ्यावेदन के माध्यम से Summarization', 'ru': 'StructSum: Суммирование через структурированные представления', 'ga': 'StructSum: Achoimre trí Léirithe Struchtúrtha', 'el': 'StructSum: Σύνοψη μέσω δομημένων αναπαραστάσεων', 'hu': 'StructSum: Összefoglalás strukturált reprezentációkkal', 'ka': 'StructSum: სტრუქტურული გამოსახულებების გამოყენება', 'it': 'StructSum: Sintesi tramite rappresentazioni strutturate', 'kk': 'Структурасы: Құрылған таңбалар арқылы тұжырымдамасы', 'mk': 'StructSum: Резултат преку структурни претставувања', 'lt': 'StruktSuma: santrauka per struktūrines atstovybes', 'ms': 'StructSum: Ringkasan melalui Perwakilan Terstruktur', 'mt': 'StructSum: Sommarju permezz ta’ Rappreżentazzjonijiet Strutturati', 'mn': 'StructureSum: Structured Representations through Summarization', 'ml': 'Structure Sum: Structured Representation via ചുരുക്കം', 'ro': 'StructSum: Summarizare prin reprezentări structurate', 'no': 'StruktSum: Samandrag gjennom strukturerte representasjonar', 'pl': 'StructSum: Podsumowanie za pomocą strukturalnych reprezentacji', 'sr': 'StrukturaSum: Summarizacija putem strukturiranih predstavljanja', 'si': 'StrructSum: සංවිධානය සංවිධානය සඳහා සංවිධානය', 'sv': 'StructSum: Sammanfattning via strukturerade representationer', 'so': 'Summary: Summary via Structured Representations', 'ur': 'Structured Representations via Summarization', 'ta': 'அமைப்பு சுருக்கம்: உருவாக்கப்பட்ட பிரதிநிகழ்வுகள் மூலம் சுருக்கம்', 'uz': 'Hisobot: Structurated Representation via summary', 'vi': 'Công cụ:', 'bg': 'StructSum: обобщаване чрез структурирани представителства', 'da': 'StructSum: Summering via strukturerede repræsentationer', 'nl': 'StructSum: Samenvatting via gestructureerde vertegenwoordigingen', 'hr': 'StrukturaSum: Summarizacija putem strukturnih predstavljanja', 'de': 'StructSum: Zusammenfassung über strukturierte Darstellungen', 'fa': 'ساختار: جمع\u200cآوری از طریق نمایش\u200cهای ساخته\u200cشده', 'id': 'StructSum: Ringkasan melalui Perwakilan Struktur', 'sw': 'StructSum: Summarization via Structured Representations', 'tr': 'Structured Representations', 'af': 'StructSum: Opsomming deur struktureerde voorstellings', 'sq': 'StructSum: Summarization via Structured Representations', 'bs': 'StrukturaSum: Summarizacija putem strukturnih predstavljanja', 'az': 'StruktSum: YapńĪlmńĪŇü T…ôŇükilatlar vasit…ôsil…ô toplama', 'bn': 'কৌশলের সাম: সংক্ষিপ্ত প্রতিনিধির মাধ্যমে সংক্ষেপ', 'am': 'ማጠቃለያ', 'ca': 'StructSum: Resumen a través de representacions estructuradas', 'hy': 'Comment', 'ko': 'StructSum: 구조적 표현으로 요약', 'et': 'StructSum: Kokkuvõte struktureeritud esinduste kaudu', 'cs': 'StructSum: Shrnutí pomocí strukturovaných reprezentací', 'fi': 'StructSum: Yhteenveto strukturoitujen edustustojen kautta', 'he': 'StructSum: Summarization via Structured Representations', 'sk': 'StructSum: Povzetek prek strukturiranih predstavništev', 'jv': 'Format:', 'ha': 'Summary', 'bo': 'StructSum: Summarization via Structured Representations'}
{'en': 'Abstractive text summarization aims at compressing the information of a long source document into a rephrased, condensed summary. Despite advances in modeling techniques, abstractive summarization models still suffer from several key challenges : (i) layout bias : they overfit to the style of training corpora ; (ii) limited abstractiveness : they are optimized to copying n-grams from the source rather than generating novel abstractive summaries ; (iii) lack of transparency : they are not interpretable. In this work, we propose a framework based on document-level structure induction for summarization to address these challenges. To this end, we propose incorporating latent and explicit dependencies across sentences in the source document into end-to-end single-document summarization models. Our framework complements standard encoder-decoder summarization models by augmenting them with rich structure-aware document representations based on implicitly learned (latent) structures and externally-derived linguistic (explicit) structures. We show that our summarization framework, trained on the CNN / DM dataset, improves the coverage of content in the source documents, generates more abstractive summaries by generating more novel n-grams, and incorporates interpretable sentence-level structures, while performing on par with standard baselines.', 'ar': 'يهدف تلخيص النص التجريدي إلى ضغط معلومات مستند المصدر الطويل في ملخص مكثف ومُعاد صياغته. على الرغم من التقدم في تقنيات النمذجة ، لا تزال نماذج التلخيص التجريدي تعاني من العديد من التحديات الرئيسية: (1) التحيز في التخطيط: فهي تتناسب مع أسلوب التدريب الجماعي ؛ (2) التجريدية المحدودة: تم تحسينها لنسخ n-grams من المصدر بدلاً من إنشاء ملخصات تجريدية جديدة ؛ (3) الافتقار إلى الشفافية: فهي غير قابلة للتفسير. في هذا العمل ، نقترح إطارًا قائمًا على الاستقراء على مستوى الوثيقة للتلخيص لمواجهة هذه التحديات. تحقيقا لهذه الغاية ، نقترح دمج التبعيات الكامنة والصريحة عبر الجمل في المستند المصدر في نماذج تلخيص وثيقة واحدة من طرف إلى طرف. يكمل إطار العمل الخاص بنا نماذج تلخيص وحدة التشفير وفك الشفرة القياسية من خلال زيادتها بتمثيلات وثيقة غنية بالوعي بالبنية تستند إلى الهياكل المكتسبة ضمنيًا (الكامنة) والهياكل اللغوية (الصريحة) المشتقة من الخارج. نوضح أن إطار التلخيص الخاص بنا ، الذي تم تدريبه على مجموعة بيانات CNN / DM ، يحسن تغطية المحتوى في المستندات المصدر ، ويولد المزيد من الملخصات المجردة من خلال إنشاء المزيد من n-grams الجديدة ، ويتضمن تراكيب على مستوى الجملة قابلة للتفسير ، أثناء الأداء على قدم المساواة مع خطوط الأساس القياسية.', 'es': 'El resumen de texto abstractivo tiene como objetivo comprimir la información de un documento fuente largo en un resumen resumido y reformulado. A pesar de los avances en las técnicas de modelado, los modelos de resumen abstractivo todavía sufren varios desafíos clave: (i) sesgo de diseño: se ajustan demasiado al estilo de los corpus de entrenamiento; (ii) abstractividad limitada: están optimizados para copiar n-gramas de la fuente en lugar de generar resúmenes abstractivos novedosos ; iii) falta de transparencia: no son interpretables. En este trabajo, proponemos un marco basado en la inducción de estructura a nivel de documento para el resumen para abordar estos desafíos. Con este fin, proponemos incorporar dependencias latentes y explícitas en las oraciones del documento fuente en modelos de resumen de un solo documento de extremo a extremo. Nuestro marco complementa los modelos de resumen de codificadores-decodificadores estándar al aumentarlos con ricas representaciones de documentos conscientes de la estructura basadas en estructuras aprendidas implícitamente (latentes) y estructuras lingüísticas (explícitas) derivadas externamente. Demostramos que nuestro marco de resumen, entrenado en el conjunto de datos de CNN/DM, mejora la cobertura del contenido en los documentos fuente, genera resúmenes más abstractivos al generar más n-gramas novedosos e incorpora estructuras interpretables a nivel de oración, a la vez que se desempeña a la par de las líneas de base estándar.', 'pt': 'A sumarização de texto abstrativa visa comprimir as informações de um documento de origem longo em um resumo condensado e reformulado. Apesar dos avanços nas técnicas de modelagem, os modelos de sumarização abstrativos ainda sofrem de vários desafios importantes: (i) viés de layout: eles se ajustam excessivamente ao estilo de corpora de treinamento; (ii) abstração limitada: eles são otimizados para copiar n-gramas da fonte ao invés de gerar novos resumos abstrativos; (iii) falta de transparência: não são interpretáveis. Neste trabalho, propomos uma estrutura baseada na indução de estrutura em nível de documento para sumarização para enfrentar esses desafios. Para este fim, propomos incorporar dependências latentes e explícitas entre sentenças no documento fonte em modelos de sumarização de documento único de ponta a ponta. Nossa estrutura complementa os modelos de sumarização de codificador-decodificador padrão, aumentando-os com ricas representações de documentos com reconhecimento de estrutura com base em estruturas aprendidas implicitamente (latentes) e estruturas linguísticas (explícitas) derivadas externamente. Mostramos que nossa estrutura de sumarização, treinada no conjunto de dados CNN/DM, melhora a cobertura do conteúdo nos documentos de origem, gera resumos mais abstrativos ao gerar mais n-gramas novos e incorpora estruturas de nível de sentença interpretáveis, ao mesmo tempo em que apresenta desempenho semelhante ao linhas de base padrão.', 'fr': "La synthèse de texte abstrait vise à compresser les informations d'un document source long en un résumé condensé reformulé. Malgré les progrès des techniques de modélisation, les modèles de synthèse abstraite souffrent encore de plusieurs défis majeurs\xa0: (i) biais de mise en page\xa0: ils s'adaptent trop au style des corpus d'entraînement\xa0; (ii) abstraction limitée\xa0: ils sont optimisés pour copier des n-grammes à partir de la source plutôt que de générer de nouveaux résumés abstractifs ; (iii) manque de transparence\xa0: ils ne sont pas interprétables. Dans ce travail, nous proposons un cadre basé sur l'induction de la structure au niveau du document pour la synthèse afin de relever ces défis. À cette fin, nous proposons d'intégrer les dépendances latentes et explicites entre les phrases du document source dans des modèles de synthèse de bout en bout de document unique. Notre framework complète les modèles de synthèse encodeur-décodeur standard en les complétant avec de riches représentations de documents sensibles à la structure basées sur des structures implicitement apprises (latentes) et des structures linguistiques (explicites) dérivées de l'extérieur. Nous montrons que notre cadre de synthèse, formé sur le jeu de données CNN/DM, améliore la couverture du contenu dans les documents sources, génère des résumés plus abstraits en générant plus de nouveaux n-grammes et incorpore des structures interprétables au niveau des phrases, tout en offrant des performances équivalentes aux lignes de base standard.", 'ja': '抽象的なテキストの要約は、長いソースドキュメントの情報を、言い換えられ、縮小された要約に圧縮することを目的としています。 モデリング技術の進歩にもかかわらず、抽象的な要約モデルは依然としていくつかの主要な課題に苦しんでいる： （ i ）レイアウトの偏り：トレーニングコーラのスタイルに適合しすぎている； （ ii ）抽象性が限られている：新規の抽象的な要約を生成するのではなく、ソースからnグラムをコピーするように最適化されている； （ iii ）透明性の欠如：解釈不可能である。 この研究では、これらの課題に対処するための要約のための文書レベルの構造誘導に基づくフレームワークを提案します。 このために、ソースドキュメント内の文間の潜在的および明示的な依存関係をエンドツーエンドのシングルドキュメントサマリゼーションモデルに組み込むことを提案します。 私たちのフレームワークは、暗黙的に学習された（潜在的な）構造と外部から派生した（明示的な）言語構造に基づいて、豊富な構造認識文書表現でそれらを拡張することによって、標準的なエンコーダ-デコーダ要約モデルを補完します。 私たちは、CNN/DMデータセットでトレーニングされた私たちの要約フレームワークが、ソースドキュメント内のコンテンツのカバレッジを向上させ、より多くの新規のn - gramを生成することによってより抽象的な要約を生成し、標準的なベースラインと同等に実行しながら、解釈可能な文レベルの構造を組み込んでいることを示します。', 'zh': '抽象文本摘要旨在将长源文档信息压缩为改作压缩摘要。 虽建模术进步,而抽象总结,犹临数要挑战:(一) 布局偏差:其过度拟合训练语料库风格;(二) 布局偏差:其与训练语料库风格不符;(三) 布局偏差:其风格不符:三) 局偏差: 其与训练语料库风格不相应;(三) 布局偏差:其与训练语料库风格不符;(三) 布局偏差:其与训练语料库风格不符;(三) 布局偏差:其与训练语料 (ii)有限之抽象性:其为优化从源中复制n-gram,非生新颖之象摘要; (三) 阙透明度:不可解也。 于是建文档归之框架,以应挑战。 请并源文档句之潜显式以并端单文档摘要。 吾框架补格之编码器-解码器摘要,基于隐式学(潜于)构外之言(显式)结构之富文档示以强之。 吾以明总框架练于CNN / DM数集上,崇其源文档之覆盖范围,成其新n-gram以成其摘要,合其可释之句,同时而基线。', 'hi': 'Abstractive text summarization का उद्देश्य एक लंबे स्रोत दस्तावेज़ की जानकारी को एक rephrased, संघनित सारांश में संपीड़ित करना है। मॉडलिंग तकनीकों में प्रगति के बावजूद, अमूर्त सारांशीकरण मॉडल अभी भी कई प्रमुख चुनौतियों से पीड़ित हैं: (i) लेआउट पूर्वाग्रह: वे प्रशिक्षण कॉर्पोरेट की शैली के लिए ओवरफिट; (ii) सीमित अमूर्तता: उन्हें उपन्यास अमूर्त सारांश उत्पन्न करने के बजाय स्रोत से एन-ग्राम की प्रतिलिपि बनाने के लिए अनुकूलित किया जाता है; (iii) पारदशता की कमी: वे व्याख्या योग्य नहीं हैं। इस काम में, हम इन चुनौतियों को संबोधित करने के लिए सारांशीकरण के लिए दस्तावेज़-स्तरीय संरचना प्रेरण के आधार पर एक रूपरेखा का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। इस अंत में, हम स्रोत दस्तावेज़ में वाक्यों में अव्यक्त और स्पष्ट निर्भरताओं को एंड-टू-एंड सिंगल-डॉक्यूमेंट सारांशीकरण मॉडल में शामिल करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारा ढांचा मानक एनकोडर-डिकोडर सारांशीकरण मॉडल को समृद्ध संरचना-जागरूक दस्तावेज़ प्रतिनिधित्व के साथ बढ़ाकर पूरक करता है जो निहित रूप से सीखा (अव्यक्त) संरचनाओं और बाहरी रूप से व्युत्पन्न भाषाई (स्पष्ट) संरचनाओं पर आधारित है। हम दिखाते हैं कि सीएनएन / डीएम डेटासेट पर प्रशिक्षित हमारा सारांशीकरण ढांचा, स्रोत दस्तावेजों में सामग्री के कवरेज में सुधार करता है, अधिक उपन्यास एन-ग्राम उत्पन्न करके अधिक अमूर्त सारांश उत्पन्न करता है, और मानक बेसलाइन के बराबर प्रदर्शन करते समय व्याख्यायोग्य वाक्य-स्तर की संरचनाओं को शामिल करता है।', 'ru': 'Абстрактное текстовое резюме направлено на сжатие информации длинного исходного документа в виде перефразированного, сжатого резюме. Несмотря на достижения в методах моделирования, модели абстрактного обобщения все еще сталкиваются с несколькими ключевыми проблемами: (i) смещение макета: они переходят в стиль обучающих корпусов; (ii) ограниченная абстрактность: они оптимизированы для копирования n-граммов из источника, а не для создания новых абстрактных резюме; (iii) отсутствие прозрачности: они не интерпретируются. В этой работе мы предлагаем структуру, основанную на введении структуры на уровне документов, для обобщения для решения этих проблем. С этой целью мы предлагаем включить скрытые и явные зависимости между предложениями в исходном документе в сквозные модели обобщения одного документа. Наш фреймворк дополняет стандартные модели обобщения кодировщика-декодера, дополняя их насыщенными структурозависимыми представлениями документов, основанными на неявно изученных (скрытых) структурах и внешних лингвистических (явных) структурах. Мы показываем, что наша структура обобщения, обученная на наборе данных CNN/DM, улучшает охват содержимого в исходных документах, генерирует более абстрактные резюме, генерируя больше новых n-грамм, и включает интерпретируемые структуры на уровне предложений, при этом работая наравне со стандартными базовыми линиями.', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag achoimriú teibí téacs an fhaisnéis ó dhoiciméad foinse fhada a chomhbhrú isteach in achoimre chomhdhlúite athfhrása. In ainneoin dul chun cinn i dteicníochtaí samhaltaithe, tá roinnt príomhdhúshlán ag baint le samhlacha achoimre teibí: (i) claonadh sa leagan amach: ró-oiriúnaíonn siad don stíl corpora oiliúna; (ii) teibíocht theoranta: déantar iad a bharrfheabhsú chun n-gram a chóipeáil ón bhfoinse seachas achoimrí teibí núíosacha a ghiniúint; (iii) easpa trédhearcachta: ní féidir iad a léirmhíniú. San obair seo, molaimid creat bunaithe ar ionduchtú struchtúir ar leibhéal doiciméad le haghaidh achoimre chun dul i ngleic leis na dúshláin seo. Chuige sin, molaimid spleáchais fholaigh agus fhollasacha trasna abairtí sa bhundoiciméad a ionchorprú i múnlaí achoimre ceann-go-deireadh doiciméid aonair. Comhlánaíonn ár gcreat samhlacha caighdeánacha achoimrithe ionchódóra-díchódóra trí iad a mhéadú le huiríll saibhir doiciméad atá feasach ar struchtúir bunaithe ar struchtúir atá foghlamtha go hintuigthe (folaigh) agus struchtúir theangeolaíocha (follasacha) a dhíorthaítear go seachtrach. Léirímid go bhfeabhsaíonn ár gcreat achoimre, atá oilte ar thacar sonraí CNN/DM, clúdach an ábhair sna bundoiciméid, go gcruthaíonn sé achoimrí níos teibí trí n-gramanna níos nuaí a ghiniúint, agus go n-ionchorpraíonn sé struchtúir inléirmhínithe ar leibhéal na habairte, agus iad ag feidhmiú ar chomhchéim le bunlínte caighdeánacha.', 'el': 'Η αφηρημένη σύνοψη κειμένου αποσκοπεί στη συμπίεση των πληροφοριών ενός μεγάλου εγγράφου προέλευσης σε μια ανασχηματισμένη, συμπυκνωμένη περίληψη. Παρά τις προόδους στις τεχνικές μοντελοποίησης, τα αφηρημένα μοντέλα συνοψίας εξακολουθούν να υποφέρουν από αρκετές βασικές προκλήσεις: (i) προκατάληψη διάταξης: ταιριάζουν με το στυλ των εκπαιδευτικών σωμάτων. (ii) περιορισμένη αφηρηματικότητα: βελτιστοποιούνται ώστε να αντιγράφουν ν-γραμμάρια από την πηγή αντί να δημιουργούν νέες αφηρηματικές περιλήψεις· (iii) έλλειψη διαφάνειας: δεν είναι ερμηνευτές. Στην εργασία αυτή, προτείνουμε ένα πλαίσιο βασισμένο στην επαγωγή δομής σε επίπεδο εγγράφων για συνοπτική ανάλυση για την αντιμετώπιση αυτών των προκλήσεων. Για το σκοπό αυτό, προτείνουμε να ενσωματώσουμε λανθάνουσες και ρητές εξαρτήσεις μεταξύ των προτάσεων στο έγγραφο προέλευσης σε ολοκληρωμένα μοντέλα συνοψίας ενός εγγράφου. Το πλαίσιο μας συμπληρώνει τα τυποποιημένα μοντέλα σύνοψης κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή εμπλουτίζοντας τα με πλούσιες αναπαραστάσεις εγγράφων που βασίζονται σε έμμεσα διδαγμένες (λανθάνουσες) δομές και εξωτερικώς προερχόμενες γλωσσικές (ρητές) δομές. Δείχνουμε ότι το πλαίσιο σύνοψής μας, εκπαιδευμένο στο σύνολο δεδομένων βελτιώνει την κάλυψη του περιεχομένου στα έγγραφα προέλευσης, παράγει πιο αφηρημένες περιλήψεις με τη δημιουργία περισσότερων νέων γραμμάτων και ενσωματώνει ερμηνευτές δομές σε επίπεδο πρότασης, ενώ αποδίδει στο ίδιο επίπεδο με τις τυπικές γραμμές βάσης.', 'hu': 'Az absztrakt szövegösszefoglaló célja egy hosszú forrásdokumentum információinak összefoglalása egy átfogó, összefoglaló összefoglalóvá. A modellezési technikák fejlődése ellenére az absztraktív összefoglaló modellek továbbra is számos kulcsfontosságú kihívással szembesülnek: (i) elrendezési elfogultság: túlságosan illeszkednek a corpora edzési stílusához; ii. korlátozott absztraktivitás: új absztraktív összefoglalók előállítása helyett az n gramm forrásból történő másolására van optimalizálva; iii. az átláthatóság hiánya: nem értelmezhető. Ebben a munkában dokumentumszintű struktúra indukcióján alapuló keretrendszert javasolunk összefoglalásra, hogy megoldjuk ezeket a kihívásokat. Ennek érdekében azt javasoljuk, hogy a forrásdokumentumban a mondatok közötti látens és explicit függőségeket építsünk be végpontos egydokumentumos összefoglalási modellekbe. Keretrendszerünk kiegészíti a szabványos kódoló-dekóder összefoglaló modelleket azzal, hogy ezeket bővíti a hallgatólagosan megtanult (látens) struktúrákon és külsőleg eredetű (explicit) nyelvi (explicit) struktúrákon alapuló gazdag, struktúra-tudatos dokumentumábrázolásokkal. Megmutatjuk, hogy a CNN/DM adatkészletre képzett összefoglaló keretrendszerünk javítja a forrásdokumentumok tartalmának lefedettségét, absztraktívabb összefoglalókat hoz létre új n-grammok generálásával, és magában foglalja az értelmezhető mondatszintű struktúrákat, miközben a standard alapvonalakkal egyenlő teljesítményt.', 'ka': 'აბსტრაქტიური ტექსტის სისუზაუზაუზაუზაუზაუზაუზაუზაუზაუზაუზაუზაუზაუზაუზაუზაუზაუზაუზაუზაუზაუზაუ მოდელური ტექნექციების წინასწარმატებით, აბსტრაქტიური სიმბოლოების მოდელები უკვე მნიშვნელოვანი გამოცდილებისგან იქნება: ii) აბსტრაქტიგურობა დაფართებულია: ისინი n-გრამების კოპორიზაციისთვის, არც პრომენტის აბსტრაქტიგური რეზიუმების შექმნა; iii) გადარწმუნელობა არ არის: ისინი არ შეუძლებელია. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ მინდომენეთ კოკუმენტის სტრუქტურის ინდექციაზე, რომელიც კოკუმენტის სტრუქტურის ინდექციაზე გადავიწყებთ, რომ ამ ამ მიზეზისთვის, ჩვენ მინდომარებით დავყენებთ ლანტენტის და გამოსახულებული განსახულებელობების შესახებ წესების დოკუმენტში ერთი დოკუმენტის სისუმენტის მოდელში. ჩვენი პარამეტრები კონფიგურაცია სტანდარტური კოდერის რეზიუმენტის მოდელების დამატებს, რომლებიც მათ ბედნიერი სტრუქტურაციას უცნობიერებული დოკუმენტის რეზიუმენტებით, რომლებიც ინფლი ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ჩვენი რეზიუმიზაციის პარამეტრი, რომელიც CNN/DM-ის მონაცემების კონტაქტის კონტაქტის კონტაქტის კონტაქტის კონტაქტის კონტაქტის კონტაქტის კონტაქტის კონტაქტის კონტაქტის კონტრაქტი', 'it': "La sintesi astratta del testo mira a comprimere le informazioni di un documento sorgente lungo in una sintesi riformulata e condensata. Nonostante i progressi nelle tecniche di modellazione, i modelli astratti di sintesi soffrono ancora di diverse sfide chiave: (i) bias layout: si adattano allo stile di allenamento corpora; (ii) astrattezza limitata: sono ottimizzati per copiare n-grammi dalla fonte piuttosto che generare nuovi riassunti astratti; iii) mancanza di trasparenza: non sono interpretabili. In questo lavoro, proponiamo un framework basato sull'induzione della struttura a livello di documento per la sintesi per affrontare queste sfide. A tal fine, proponiamo di incorporare dipendenze latenti ed esplicite tra le frasi nel documento di origine in modelli end-to-end di sintesi di singoli documenti. Il nostro framework integra i modelli standard di sintesi encoder-decoder incrementandoli con ricche rappresentazioni documentali consapevoli della struttura basate su strutture implicitamente apprese (latenti) e strutture linguistiche (esplicite) derivate esternamente. Dimostriamo che il nostro framework di sintesi, formato sul dataset CNN/DM, migliora la copertura dei contenuti nei documenti di origine, genera riassunti più astratti generando più nuovi n-grammi, e incorpora strutture a livello di frase interpretabili, pur funzionando alla pari delle linee di base standard.", 'kk': 'Абстрактивті мәтін тұжырымдамасы ұзын көзі құжаттың мәліметін қайта көзгертілген, тұжырымдамасына сығу үшін мақсатты. Модель технологияларының өзгерістеріне қарай, абстрактивті жазылу үлгілері бірнеше негізгі мәселелерден тұрады: ii) шектелген абстрактивдік: олар жаңа абстрактивтік тұжырымдарды құру орнына, көзінен n- граммаларды көшірмелеу үшін оптимизацияланады; iii) мөлдірлік жоқ: олар аударылмайды. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, құжат деңгейіндегі структура индукциясына негізделген қоршауын таңдаймыз. Бұл үшін біз көздегі құжаттың соңындағы жалғыз құжаттың тәуелдіктерін бір құжаттың тәуелдігіне сәйкес және түсінікті үлгілеріне қосу үшін ұсынамыз. Біздің қоршауымыз стандартты кодер- декодер қосымша үлгілерін қолданып, оларды бағатты құжатты құрылғылар түсініктемелерімен көтеріп, негізінде үйренген (кейінгі) құрылғылар мен сыртқы лингвистик (түсінікті)  Біз CNN/DM деректер жиынында оқылған тұжырымдамызды көрсетедік, көзінің құжаттарының мазмұнын жақсартып, жалпы n-граммаларды жасап, жалпы нәтижелерді жасап, стандартты негізгі сызықтарды қолданатын тұжырымдамызды жасайды.', 'lt': 'Abstraktyvios teksto santraukos tikslas – suspausti ilgo šaltinio dokumento informaciją į pakartotinę, kondensuotą santrauką. Despite advances in modeling techniques, abstractive summarization models still suffer from several key challenges: (i) layout bias: they overfit to the style of training corpora;  ii) ribotas abstraktyvumas: jie optimizuojami kopijant n-gramus iš šaltinio, o ne sukuriant naujas abstraktines santraukas; iii) skaidrumo trūkumas: jie negali būti aiškinami. Šiame darbe siūlome sistemą, grindžiamą dokumentų lygmens struktūros skatinimu apibendrinti šiuos uždavinius. Šiuo tikslu siūlome į pradinį dokumentą įtraukti latentines ir aiškias skirtingų sakinių priklausomybes į vienkartinio dokumento santraukos modelius. Mūsų sistema papildo standartinius kodavimo kodavimo ir kodavimo santraukų modelius, papildant juos turtingais struktūriškai suprantamais dokumentų atstovais, grindžiamais netiesiogiai išmoktomis (latenčiomis) struktūromis ir išorinėmis kalbinėmis (aiškiomis) struktūromis. Mes parodome, kad mūsų santraukų sistema, parengta CNN/DM duomenų rinkinyje, gerina šaltinio dokumentų turinio aprėptį, sukuria abstraktesnes santraukas sukuriant naujesnius n-gramus ir apima aiškinamąsias sakinių lygio struktūras, tuo pačiu vykdant lygiavertes standartines bazes.', 'mt': 'Is-sommarju tat-test abstrattiv għandu l-għan li jikkompressa l-informazzjoni ta’ dokument twil ta’ sors f’sommarju mfassal mill-ġdid u kkondensat. Minkejja l-avvanzi fit-tekniki tal-immudellar, il-mudelli ta’ sommarju astrattiv għadhom isofru minn diversi sfidi ewlenin: (i) preġudizzju għat-tqassim: dawn jaqblu wisq mal-istil ta’ korpora ta’ taħriġ; (ii) abstrattività limitata: huma ottimizzati biex jikkopjaw n-grammi mis-sors minflok jiġġeneraw sommarji abstrattivi ġodda; (iii) nuqqas ta’ trasparenza: mhumiex interpretabbli. F’din il-ħidma, qed nipproponu qafas ibbażat fuq l-induzzjoni ta’ struttura fil-livell ta’ dokumenti għall-ġbir fil-qosor biex jiġu indirizzati dawn l-isfidi. Għal dan il-għan, qed nipproponu li jiġu inkorporati d-dipendenzi moħbija u espliċiti bejn is-sentenzi fid-dokument tas-sors fil-mudelli ta’ sommarju ta’ dokument wieħed minn tmiem sa tmiem. Il-qafas tagħna jikkumplimenta mudelli standard ta’ sommarju tal-kodifikatur-dekoder billi jżidhom b’rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ dokumenti rikki konxji mill-istruttura bbażati fuq strutturi (moħbija) imgħallma impliċitament u strutturi lingwistiċi (espliċiti) derivati minn barra. We show that our summarization framework, trained on the CNN/DM dataset, improves the coverage of content in the source documents, generates more abstractive summaries by generating more novel n-grams, and incorporates interpretable sentence-level structures, while performing on par with standard baselines.', 'mk': 'Апстрактивна резултата на текстот има за цел компресирање на информациите од долг извор документ во рефразиран, кондензиран резултат. И покрај напредокот во техниките на моделирање, апстрактивните модели на резултат сé уште страдаат од неколку клучни предизвици: (i) предраспоред на распоредот: тие се премногу прилагодени на стилот на обука на корпора; (ii) ограничена апстрактивност: тие се оптимизирани да се копираат n-грами од изворот наместо да се генерираат нови апстрактивни резултати; (iii) недостаток на транспарентност: тие не се интерпретабилни. In this work, we propose a framework based on document-level structure induction for summarization to address these challenges.  За оваа цел, предлагаме вклучување на latent и експлицитни зависности помеѓу речениците во изворниот документ во моделите на крај до крај за резултат на еден документ. Нашата рамка ги комплиментира стандардните модели за резимирање на кодерот и декодерот со зголемување на нив со богати претставувања на документите со свесност за структурата, базирани на имплицитно научени (лантни) структури и екструктивни (експлицитни) ја Покажуваме дека нашата рамка за резултати, обучена на податоците на СНН/ДМ, ја подобрува покривањето на содржината во изворните документи, генерира поапстрактивни резултати со генерирање на нови n-грами, и вклучува интерпретабилни структури на ниво на реченици, истовремено работејќи во рамките на стандардните ба', 'ms': 'Penapisan teks abstraktif bermaksud memampatkan maklumat dokumen sumber panjang ke dalam ringkasan dikondensasi semula. Walaupun kemajuan dalam teknik pemodelan, model penghuraian abstraktif masih menderita dari beberapa cabaran utama: (i) bias bentangan: mereka terlalu cocok dengan gaya pelatihan corpora; (ii) limited abstractiveness: they are optimized to copying n-grams from the source rather than generating novel abstractive summaries;  (iii) kekurangan keterlaluan: mereka tidak dapat diterangkan. Dalam kerja ini, kami melamar kerangka berdasarkan induksi struktur aras dokumen untuk ringkasan untuk mengatasi cabaran ini. Untuk tujuan ini, kami cadangkan menggabungkan dependensi tersembunyi dan eksplisit di seluruh kalimat dalam dokumen sumber ke model ringkasan dokumen tunggal akhir-akhir. kerangka kami menambahkan model ringkasan pengekod-dekoder piawai dengan menambah mereka dengan persembahan dokumen yang sedar-struktur yang kaya berdasarkan struktur yang telah belajar secara implicit (latent) dan struktur bahasa (eksplicit) yang berasal dari luar. Kami menunjukkan bahawa kerangka pengringkasan kami, dilatih pada set data CNN/DM, meningkatkan penutupan kandungan dalam dokumen sumber, menghasilkan ringkasan yang lebih abstraktif dengan menghasilkan n-gram yang lebih baru, dan memasukkan struktur tahap kalimat yang boleh diterangkan, sementara melaksanakan sama dengan garis dasar piawai.', 'ml': 'ഒരു നീണ്ട ഉറവിട രേഖയുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുതുക്കം ചെയ്യുന്നതും, കോണ്\u200dഡന്\u200dസ് ചെയ്ത വിവരങ്ങളിലേക്ക് ചേര്\u200dക്കുവാനുള്ള ആ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയിലെ മുന്നേറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d സംഭവിച്ചാലും അസാധ്യതയില്ലാത്ത ചുരുക്കത്തിന്റെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d കുറേക്കാളുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വേദനിക (ii) പരിധിയില്ലാത്ത അസ്വഭാവം: സ്രോതസ്സില്\u200d നിന്ന് n-ഗ്രാമുകള്\u200d പകര്\u200dത്തുന്നതിന് പകര്\u200dത്തുന്നതിന് പകര്\u200dത്താന്\u200d അവര്\u200dക്ക്  (iii) സ്വകാര്യത്തിന്റെ കുറവ്: അത് വ്യാഖ്യാനിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയില്ല. ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഫ്രെയിമ്പുകള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. ഈ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d. ഈ അവസാനത്തിനുവേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു, പ്രത്യക്ഷമായ വാക്കുകളില്\u200d എല്ലാ വാക്കുകളിലും ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതും വ്യക്തമായ ആശ Our framework complements standard encoder-decoder summarization models by augmenting them with rich structure-aware document representations based on implicitly learned (latent) structures and externally-derived linguistic (explicit) structures.  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു, സിഎന്\u200d/ഡിഎം ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട നമ്മുടെ ചുരുക്കത്തിന്റെ ഫ്രെയിമേഷന്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമേറ്റ്, സോര്\u200dസ് രേഖകളിലുള്ള വസ്തുക്കളുടെ കൂടുതല', 'pl': 'Abstrakcyjne podsumowanie tekstu ma na celu skompresowanie informacji z długiego dokumentu źródłowego w przeformułowane, skondensowane podsumowanie. Pomimo postępów w technikach modelowania, modele abstrakcyjne podsumowujące nadal cierpią na kilka kluczowych wyzwań: (i) uprzedzenia układu: nadmiernie pasują do stylu korpusów treningowych; (ii) ograniczona abstrakcyjność: są one zoptymalizowane do kopiowania n-gramów ze źródła zamiast generowania nowych abstrakcyjnych streszczeń; (iii) brak przejrzystości: nie są one interpretowalne. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy ramy oparte na indukcji struktury dokumentów do podsumowania, aby sprostać tym wyzwaniom. W tym celu proponujemy włączenie ukrytych i wyraźnych zależności między zdaniami w dokumencie źródłowym do kompleksowych modeli podsumowania pojedynczego dokumentu. Nasz framework uzupełnia standardowe modele podsumowania koderów-dekoderów poprzez rozszerzenie ich o bogate reprezentacje dokumentów oparte na ukrytych (utajonych) strukturach i zewnętrznie pochodzonych struktur językowych (jawnych). Pokazujemy, że nasz framework sumaryzacji, przeszkolony na zbiorze danych CNN/DM, poprawia zasięg treści w dokumentach źródłowych, generuje bardziej abstrakcyjne podsumowania poprzez generowanie większej ilości nowych n-gramów oraz zawiera interpretowalne struktury na poziomie zdań, działając jednocześnie na równi ze standardowymi liniami bazowymi.', 'mn': 'Abstractive text summarization aims to compress the information of a long source document into a rephrased, condensed summary. Модель загварын технологиудын хөгжлийн үр дүнд хэдий ч чухал сорилтуудаас зовлон байдаг: тэд сургалтын корпора хэлбэртэй адилхан байдаг. ii) хязгаарлагдмал абстрактив байдал: үүсвэрээс n-граммыг хуулбарлахын оронд шинэ абстрактив нийлүүлэлтийг бий болгохын оронд нэмэгдүүлэгддэг. iii) тодорхой байдлын алдаагүй: тэд тодорхойлж чадахгүй. Энэ ажил дээр бид баримтын түвшинд суурилсан бүтцийн үйлдвэрлэл дээр эдгээр сорилтуудыг зохицуулахын тулд санал дэвшүүлдэг. Энэ төгсгөлд бид эх үүсвэрийн баримт нэг баримт дуусгах загвар болгох үед хамааралтай, тодорхой хамааралтай байдлыг нэгтгэх санал болгоно. Бидний үйл ажиллагаа нь стандарт коддогч-декодтой жимс хэлбэрийн загваруудыг нэмэгдүүлж, баян бүтээгдэхүүнтэй баримтуудын илэрхийлэл дээр нэмэгдүүлдэг. Бид CNN/DM өгөгдлийн сургуульд сургалтын хэмжээний хэмжээсүүдийг эх үүсвэрийн баримтын хэмжээсүүдийг сайжруулж, илүү шинэ n-грамм гаргаж, илүү шинэ хэмжээсүүдийг бий болгодог бөгөөд хэлбэрийн хэмжээсүүдийг хэмжээсүүдийн хэмжээсүүди', 'ro': 'Rezumatul abstractiv al textelor vizează comprimarea informațiilor unui document sursă lungă într-un rezumat reformulat, condensat. În ciuda progreselor înregistrate în tehnicile de modelare, modelele de sintetizare abstractivă suferă încă de mai multe provocări cheie: (i) părtinirea aspectului: ele se potrivesc stilului de formare corporală; (ii) abstractivitate limitată: acestea sunt optimizate pentru a copia n-grame din sursă, în loc să genereze rezumate abstractive noi; (iii) lipsa transparenței: acestea nu pot fi interpretate. În această lucrare, propunem un cadru bazat pe introducerea structurii la nivel de document pentru rezumare pentru a aborda aceste provocări. În acest scop, propunem încorporarea dependențelor latente și explicite între propoziții din documentul sursă în modele end-to-end de rezumare a unui singur document. Cadrul nostru completează modelele standard de sintetizare a encoder-decoder prin completarea acestora cu reprezentări bogate de documente conștiente de structură bazate pe structuri implicite învățate (latente) și structuri lingvistice (explicite) derivate din exterior. Arătăm că cadrul nostru de rezumare, instruit pe setul de date CNN/DM, îmbunătățește acoperirea conținutului documentelor sursă, generează rezumate mai abstractive prin generarea mai multor n-grame noi și încorporează structuri interpretabile la nivel de propoziții, performând în același timp la egalitate cu liniile de bază standard.', 'no': 'Abstraktiv tekstsamansering måtar å komprimera informasjonen om ei lang kjeldedokument til ei rephrasert, kondensert samansett. Til tross avansert i modelleringsteknikkar, abstraktive sammendragsmodular blir fortsatt pågått frå fleire nøkkelutfordringar: i) utformingsfordringar: dei passar over stilen til opplæringskorpora; ii) begrenset abstraktivitet: dei er optimalisert for å kopiera n-gramar frå kjelden i staden for å laga novelle abstraktive samandrag; iii) manglar gjennomsikt: dei er ikkje tolkbare. I dette arbeidet foreslår vi eit rammeverk basert på dokumentnivåstrukturinduksjon for sammendraging for å handtera desse utfordringane. I denne slutten foreslår vi å inkludere latent og eksplisitt avhengighet over setningar i kjeldedokumentet til sammendragmodeller for ein dokument som slutt til slutt. Rammeverket vårt complementerer standardkoder- dekoder- samanseringsmodular ved å auka dei med rike strukturviste dokumentrepresentasjonar basert på implisitt lærte (latere) strukturar og eksterne (eksplisitt) lingviske strukturar. Vi viser at sammendragsarområdet vårt, trent på CNN/DM-datasettet, forbedrar omdekking av innhaldet i kjeldedokumenta, lagar meir abstraktive sammendragar ved å laga meir novelle n-gramar, og inkluderer tolkbare setningsnivå-strukturar, mens du utfører sammendrag med standard baselinjer.', 'sr': 'Abstraktivna sažetka teksta cilja je da kompresira informacije dugog izvorskog dokumenta u rephrazirani, kondensirani sažetak. Uprkos napretku u modeliranim tehnikama, apstraktivni modeli sažetke još uvijek pate od nekoliko ključnih izazova: i) predrasude za raspored: oni su premladni stilu obuke korpore; ii) ograničena abstraktivnost: oni su optimizovani na kopiranje n-grama iz izvora umjesto da stvaraju nove abstraktivne sažetke; iii) nedostatak transparentnosti: oni nisu interpretabilni. U ovom poslu predlažemo okvir na osnovu indukcije strukture na nivou dokumenta za sažetanje kako bi se riješili ovi izazovi. Za taj cilj predlažemo uključivanje latentne i eksplicitne zavisnosti preko rečenica iz izvornog dokumenta u modele sažetke jednog dokumenta do kraja. Naš okvir dopunjava standardne modele sažetke kodera i dekodera povećavajući ih sa bogatim predstavljanjima dokumenta koji su osnovani na implicitno naučenim (latentnim) strukturama i vanjskim jezičkim (eksplicitnim) strukturama. Pokazujemo da naš sažetak okvir, obučen na CNN/DM-u, poboljšava pokrivanje sadržaja u izvornim dokumentima, stvara više abstraktivnih sažetaka stvaranjem novih n-grama i uključuje strukture na razini rečenica, dok izvodimo standardne osnovne linije.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක පාළුව සංශ්\u200dය සංශ්\u200dය අදහස් කරනවා ලොකු ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරමයක් තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ව මොඩේල් විද්\u200dයාවයේ ප්\u200dරධාන විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200d (i) සීමාවිත අවශ්\u200dයතාවය: ඔවුන් ප්\u200dරභාවෙන් n-ග්\u200dරාම්ස් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න වෙනුවෙන් නිර්මාණය කරන් (Ii) පාරදේශතාවක් අවශ්\u200dය: ඔවුන් අභිවාදය කරන්න බෑ. මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා මේ අභ්\u200dයානයක් සම්බන්ධ කරගන්න ලැබුණු ලැබුණු ලැබුණු  මේ අවසානයෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා ලේටින්ට් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින අපේ පරීක්ෂණය සම්පූර්ණය ප්\u200dරමාණය කොඩර් ඩිකෝඩර් සුම්පූර්ණය මොඩේල්ස් වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂ ස්ථාපනය සඳහා විශේෂ ස්ථාපනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරමා අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ සාර්මාණික සංවිධානය, CNN/DEM දත්ත සංවිධානයේ ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා සාර්මාණික සංවිධානය සඳහා විශේෂ සං', 'sv': 'Abstraktiv textsammanfattning syftar till att komprimera informationen i ett långt källdokument till en omformulerad, kondenserad sammanfattning. Trots framsteg i modelleringstekniker lider abstrakta sammanfattningsmodeller fortfarande av flera viktiga utmaningar: (i) layoutbias: de passar över till stilen för träning av corpora; ii) Begränsad abstraktivitet: De är optimerade för att kopiera n-gram från källan i stället för att generera nya abstrakta sammanfattningar. iii) Brist på öppenhet: de är inte tolkningsbara. I detta arbete föreslår vi ett ramverk baserat på dokumentnivå strukturinduktion för sammanfattning för att möta dessa utmaningar. Därför föreslår vi att latenta och explicita beroenden integreras mellan meningar i källdokumentet i heltäckande sammanfattningsmodeller för enskilda dokument. Vårt ramverk kompletterar standardmodeller för sammanfattning av kodare och avkodare genom att utöka dem med rika strukturmedvetna dokumentrepresentationer baserade på implicit lärda (latenta) strukturer och externt härledda språkliga (explicita) strukturer. Vi visar att vårt sammanfattningsram, tränat på CNN/DM datauppsättningen, förbättrar täckningen av innehållet i källdokumenten, genererar mer abstrakta sammanfattningar genom att generera fler nya n-gram, och införlivar tolkningsbara meningsnivåstrukturer, samtidigt som de presterar i nivå med standardbaslinjer.', 'ur': 'آبٹراسیٹ ٹیکسٹ سپورٹ کا مطابق ہے کہ ایک لانگ سورس ڈیکسٹم کے معلومات کو دوبارہ دفع کیا گیا اور کنڈنس سپورٹ میں دفع کرنا چاہتا ہے. موڈلینگ ٹیکنیک کی پیشرفت کے باوجود، ابھی چند کلیز چالیوں سے اچھی طرح مصنوعی موڈل ہیں: (i) لائوٹ غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر قابل تعلیم کرتا ہے۔ (ii) محدود غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر (iii) روشنی کے کمزور ہیں، یہ تعبیر قابل نہیں ہیں۔ اس کام میں ہم ایک فرمود پیش کریں گے جو دکمان سطح کی ساختاری پر بنیاد ہے کہ ان چالوں کے بارے میں تحقیق کریں۔ اس کے لئے ہم نے لٹینٹ اور کھول کھول کھول کھول دینے کی تعریفیں سورس دکھانے میں ایک دکھانے کے سامنے موڈل میں شامل کرنا پیشنهاد کرتا ہے. ہمارا فرمود استاندارڈ ڈیکوڈر ڈیکوڈر ڈاکوڈر ڈاکوڈر ڈاکوڈر کے مطابق ان کو ثروتمند ساختار علم دکھانے والی دکھانے کے ذریعہ زیادہ کرتا ہے ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارے سامنے ڈیٹ سٹ پر آموزش کی گئی سین/ڈیٹ ڈیٹ سٹ کے ذریعہ، سورس دکھانوں میں موجود موجودات کا پورے اچھا کرتا ہے، اور زیادہ نومین ن-گرم پیدا کرتا ہے، اور مطلوب سٹ سٹ کی ساختاری شامل کرتا ہے، اور استاندارڈ بیس لین کے', 'so': "Qiimeynta qoraalka ah ee Abstractive wuxuu ku qoran yahay inuu hoos dhigo macluumaadka warqada aad u dheer ee warqada rasmiga ah oo uu soo celiyey, oo uu soo daabacay. Inta kastoo uu horumarinayo qaababka sameynta, qaababka koorsooyinka ee iskudarka ah weli waxay dhibaatooyin badan ku jiraan:(i) qalabka wax lagu sameeyo: waxay u baaraandegaan qaababka waxbarashada shirkadaha; (ii) waxyaabaha xad u leh: waxaa habboon in laga koobi karo n-gram, taas oo aan abuurin summariyo diidmo ah ee warqada la'aanta ah; (iii) baahida muuqashada: ma turjumi karo. Markaas waxan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa shirkad ku saleysan dhismaha saxda ee dukumentiga si loo soo qoro si aan u qabsado dhibaatooyinkaas. To this end, we propose incorporating latent and explicit dependencies across sentences in the source document into end-to-end single-document summarization models.  Qoraalkayaga ayaa dhammaynaya modelalka koordirada ah ee kaararka ah, waxayna ku kordhisaa dhismaha taajirka ah ee muuqashada dhismaha aqoonsan ee ku saleynaya dhismaha la bartay (latent) iyo dhismaha luuqadaha dibadda laga soo saaray (explicit). Waxaynu muujinnaa in qorshaha lagu barto CNN/DM, oo lagu tababariyey qoraalka macluumaadka, uu kordhiyo daboolka ku jira dukumentiyada sourceed, wuxuu sameeyaa summariyo badan oo ka mid ah qorshaha n-gram, wuxuuna ku qoraa dhismaha lagu turjumo heerka, marka lagu sameynayo qoraalka caadiga ah.", 'ta': 'நீண்ட மூல ஆவணத்தின் தகவலை சுருக்கும் பொருட்டு, கொண்டுள்ள சுருக்கம். மாதிரி தொழில்நுட்பத்தில் முன்னேற்றங்கள் இருந்தாலும், செயல்படாத சுருக்க மாதிரிகள் இன்னும் பல விசையாக சவால்களிலிருந்து பாதிக்கப (ii) வரையறை செயல்படுத்தும் செயல்படுத்துதல்: மூலத்திலிருந்து n- கிராம்களை நகலெடுக்க முடியவில்லை; புதிய சுருக்கத்தை உருவ (i) ஊடுருவல் இல்லை: அவை முடியாது. இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு சட்டத்தை ஆவண- நிலை கட்டுப்பாட்டு உருவாக்கத்தை அடிப்படையில் சுருக்கமாக்குவதற்கான சவா இந்த முடிவிற்கு, நாம் சமீபத்தில் மற்றும் வெளிப்படையான சார்ந்த சார்ந்த சார்ந்ததை சேர்த்து மூல ஆவணத்தில் முடிவில் முடிவில்  எங்கள் சட்டத்தில் நிலையான குறியீட்டாளர் சுருக்கம் மாதிரிகளை அதிகரித்து செலுத்துவதன் மூலம் அதிகப்படுத்துகிறது பொருத்தமான கற்ற (சமீபத்தான) கட்டுமைகளையும் வ நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் என்றால் சிஎன்ன்/டிஎம் தரவுத்தளத்தில் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட எங்கள் சுருக்க விளிம்பு, மூல ஆவணங்களில் உள்ள உள்ளடக்கத்தை மேம்படுத்துகிறது, மேலும் சில புதிய n- கி', 'uz': "Name Moslamalarni taʼminlovchi darajada taʼminlovchi darajalarga aytish mumkin modellari esa bir necha muhim muammolardan ham murakkab beradi:(i) tuzuvchi taʼminlovchi taʼminlovchilar: ular kompaniya shaklida o'tibor beradi; (ii) cheksiz abstraktivity: novel abstractive summary yaratishdan uni manbandan nusxa olish imkoniyatini moslash mumkin; (ii) shaffof emas: ular ma'lum emas. Bu ishda, biz hujjat darajasi tuzuvchi tuzuvni yaratish uchun murakkab qilamiz. Hozirda, biz yangi kelajak va yaxshi so'zlarni bir necha hujjat hisoblash modellariga qo'shish va tahrirlash imkoniyatini tahrirlash talab qilamiz. Name Биз кўрсатамиз, CNN/DM маълумотлари маълумотлари тайёрланган, манбаъ ҳужжатларидаги maʼlumotni oshirish, yangi novel n-gram yaratish bilan ko'proq qisqartmalarni yaratish, va soʻzning darajali structuriyalarini kiritish va andoza tugmalar bilan bajarayotganda.", 'vi': 'Bản tóm tắt văn bản thể hấp dẫn nhằm thu thập các thông tin của một tài liệu nguồn dài thành một bản tóm tắt. Mặc dù có tiến bộ trong kỹ thuật tạo mẫu, các mô- đun tóm tắt trừu tượng vẫn còn phải chịu nhiều thử thách quan trọng: Sự trừu tượng giới hạn: chúng được dùng để chép n-gram từ nguồn chứ không tạo ra những tóm tắt trừu tượng mới. Sự thiếu sáng suốt không thể giải thích được. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề xuất một cơ sở dựa trên cấu trúc văn bản để tóm tắt những thử thách này. Vì vậy, chúng tôi đề nghị áp dụng các mối quan hệ ngầm và rõ ràng trong các câu trong tài liệu nguồn vào các mô hình mô tả mô phỏng tài liệu tận cùng. Phần cấu trúc của chúng ta bổ sung cho mô- đun đơn giản mã hóa tiêu chuẩn bằng cách bổ sung chúng với các mô- trình tài liệu đầy đủ cấu trúc dựa trên các cấu trúc ngầm (tiềm ẩn) đã học và các cấu trúc ngôn ngữ (dứt) bên ngoài. Chúng tôi cho thấy cơ sở tóm tắt của chúng tôi, được đào tạo trên bộ dữ liệu của CNN/DM, cải thiện việc cung cấp n ội dung trong tài liệu nguồn, tạo ra các tóm tắt nhiều hơn bằng cách tạo ra ni-grams nhiều hơn, và thu nhập các cấu trúc có thể giải thích, trong khi làm việc bằng những bản nền chuẩn.', 'bg': 'Резюмето на резюмето на текста цели компресиране на информацията от дълъг изходен документ в преработено, обобщено резюме. Въпреки напредъка в моделните техники, абстрактните модели на обобщаване все още страдат от няколко ключови предизвикателства: (и) пристрастяване на оформлението: те надхвърлят стила на тренировъчните корпори; ii) ограничена абстрактност: те са оптимизирани да копират n-грама от източника, а не да генерират нови абстрактни резюмета; iii) липса на прозрачност: те не могат да бъдат тълкувани. В тази работа предлагаме рамка, основана на индукция на структурата на ниво документ, за обобщаване на тези предизвикателства. За тази цел предлагаме включване на латентни и изрични зависимости между изреченията в изходния документ в модели за обобщаване на един документ от край до край. Нашата рамка допълва стандартните модели за обобщаване на кодер-декодер, като ги разширява с богати структурни изображения на документи, базирани на имплицитно научени (латентни) структури и външни лингвистични (експлицитни) структури. Показваме, че нашата рамка за обобщаване, обучена върху набора от данни подобрява покритието на съдържанието в изходните документи, генерира по-абстрактни обобщения чрез генериране на повече нови н-грами и включва интерпретируеми структури на ниво изречение, като същевременно изпълнява равностойно със стандартните базови линии.', 'da': 'Abstraktiv tekst resuméering sigter mod at komprimere oplysningerne i et langt kildedokument til et omformuleret, kondenseret resumé. På trods af fremskridt inden for modelleringsteknikker lider abstraktive opsummeringsmodeller stadig af flere centrale udfordringer: (i) layout bias: de overpasser til stil med træning corpora; - begrænset abstraktivitet: de er optimeret til at kopiere n-gram fra kilden i stedet for at generere nye abstrakte resuméer - manglende gennemsigtighed: De kan ikke fortolkes. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en ramme baseret på dokumentniveau struktur induktion til opsummering for at løse disse udfordringer. Med henblik herpå foreslår vi at indarbejde latente og eksplicitte afhængigheder på tværs af sætninger i kildedokumentet i end-to-end enkeltdokumentsammenfatningsmodeller. Vores ramme supplerer standard encoder-dekoder opsummeringsmodeller ved at udvide dem med rige strukturbevidste dokumentrepræsentationer baseret på implicit lærte (latente) strukturer og eksternt afledte sproglige (eksplicitte) strukturer. Vi viser, at vores sammenfattende ramme, trænet på CNN/DM datasættet, forbedrer dækningen af indholdet i kildedokumenterne, genererer mere abstrakte sammenfatninger ved at generere flere nye n-grams, og indarbejder fortolkningsbare sætningsniveau strukturer, samtidig med at de fungerer på niveau med standard basislinjer.', 'nl': 'Abstractieve tekstsamenvatting is bedoeld om de informatie van een lang brondocument te comprimeren tot een hergeformuleerde, samengestelde samenvatting. Ondanks vooruitgang in modelleringstechnieken, hebben abstractieve samenvattingsmodellen nog steeds te kampen met een aantal belangrijke uitdagingen: (i) lay-out bias: ze passen overall aan de stijl van trainingscorpora; (ii) beperkte abstractiviteit: ze zijn geoptimaliseerd voor het kopiëren van n-grammen van de bron in plaats van het genereren van nieuwe abstractieve samenvattingen; (iii) gebrek aan transparantie: ze zijn niet interpreteerbaar. In dit werk stellen we een raamwerk voor dat gebaseerd is op structurele inductie op documentniveau voor samenvatting om deze uitdagingen aan te pakken. Daarom stellen we voor om latente en expliciete afhankelijkheden tussen zinnen in het brondocument op te nemen in end-to-end samenvattingsmodellen voor één document. Ons framework vult standaard encoder-decoder samenvattingsmodellen aan door ze uit te breiden met rijke structuren bewuste documentrepresentaties gebaseerd op impliciet aangeleerde (latente) structuren en extern afgeleide linguïstische (expliciete) structuren. We laten zien dat ons samenvattingsframework, getraind op de CNN/DM dataset, de dekking van de inhoud in de brondocumenten verbetert, meer abstractieve samenvattingen genereert door meer nieuwe n-grammen te genereren, en interpreteerbare zinsstructuren bevat, terwijl het op gelijke voet presteert met standaard basislijnen.', 'hr': 'Abstraktivna sažetka teksta cilja je kompresirati informacije dugog izvornog dokumenta u rephrazirani, kondensirani sažetak. Unatoč napretku u modeliranim tehnikama, modeli abstraktivne sažetke još uvijek pate od nekoliko ključnih izazova: i) predrasude za raspored: oni su preuklapali u stil obuke tijela; ii) ograničena apstraktivnost: optimizirana su na kopiranje n-grama iz izvora umjesto proizvodnje novih abstraktivnih sažetaka; iii) nedostatak transparentnosti: oni ne mogu interpretirati. U ovom poslu predlažemo okvir na temelju indukcije strukture na razini dokumenta za sažetak rješavanja ovih izazova. Za taj cilj predlažemo uključiti latentne i jasne zavisnosti preko rečenica iz izvornog dokumenta u modele sažetke jednodokumenta do kraja. Naš okvir dopunjava standardne modele sažetke kodera-dekodera povećavajući ih sa bogatim predstavljanjima dokumenta koji znaju strukturu na temelju implicitno naučenih (latentnih) struktura i vanjskih jezičkih struktura. Pokazujemo da naš okvir za sažetak, obučen na CNN/DM podacima, poboljšava pokrivanje sadržaja u izvornim dokumentima, stvara apstraktivnije sažetke stvaranjem novih n-grama i uključuje strukture na razini rečenica koja se interpretiraju, dok se čine o tome s standardnim osnovnim linijama.', 'id': 'Persingkatan teks abstraktif bermaksud mengkompresi informasi dari dokumen sumber panjang ke dalam ringkasan yang dikonsensasi ulang. Meskipun kemajuan dalam teknik modeling, model abstraktif perhitungan masih menderita dari beberapa tantangan kunci: (i) bias layout: mereka terlalu cocok dengan gaya pelatihan corpora; (ii) abstraksi terbatas: mereka optimisasi untuk menyalin n-gram dari sumber daripada menghasilkan ringkasan abstraksi novel; (iii) ketidaktransparansi: mereka tidak dapat diterjemahkan. In this work, we propose a framework based on document-level structure induction for summarization to address these challenges.  Untuk tujuan ini, kami mengusulkan inkorporasi ketergantungan dan eksplisit di antara kalimat dalam dokumen sumber ke model penglihatan dokumen tunggal akhir-akhir. Cadangan kami menambahkan model penglihatan kode-dekoder standar dengan menambah mereka dengan representation dokumen yang kaya struktur-aware berdasarkan struktur yang secara implicit belajar (latent) dan struktur bahasa (eksplicit) yang berasal dari luar. Kami menunjukkan bahwa kerangka pengsingkatan kami, dilatih pada set data CNN/DM, meningkatkan penutupan isi dalam dokumen sumber, menghasilkan ringkasan yang lebih abstraktif dengan menghasilkan n-gram yang lebih novel, dan memasukkan struktur tahap kalimat yang dapat diterjemahkan, sementara melakukan secara sama dengan garis dasar standar.', 'de': 'Abstraktive Textzusammenfassung zielt darauf ab, die Informationen eines langen Quelldokuments in eine umformulierte, verdichtete Zusammenfassung zu komprimieren. Trotz Fortschritte in der Modellierungstechnik leiden abstraktive Zusammenfassungsmodelle immer noch unter mehreren zentralen Herausforderungen: (i) Layoutverzerrungen: Sie passen sich dem Stil von Trainingskorpora an; (ii) begrenzte Abstraktivität: Sie sind so optimiert, dass N-Gramm aus der Quelle kopiert werden, anstatt neue abstraktive Zusammenfassungen zu erstellen; (iii) mangelnde Transparenz: Sie sind nicht interpretierbar. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir ein Framework vor, das auf Strukturinduktion auf Dokumentenebene basiert, um diese Herausforderungen zu bewältigen. Zu diesem Zweck schlagen wir vor, latente und explizite Abhängigkeiten über Sätze hinweg im Quelldokument in End-to-End-Zusammenfassungsmodelle zu integrieren. Unser Framework ergänzt Standard-Encoder-Decoder-Zusammenfassungsmodelle, indem es sie um umfangreiche strukturbewusste Dokumentrepräsentationen erweitert, die auf implizit erlernten (latenten) Strukturen und extern abgeleiteten linguistischen (expliziten) Strukturen basieren. Wir zeigen, dass unser Zusammenfassungs-Framework, das auf dem CNN/DM-Datensatz trainiert wurde, die Abdeckung des Inhalts in den Quelldokumenten verbessert, abstraktere Zusammenfassungen generiert, indem mehr neuartige n-Gramm generiert und interpretierbare Satzstrukturen integriert, während es auf Augenhöhe mit Standard-Baselines funktioniert.', 'fa': 'تعداد متن abstractive هدف این است که اطلاعات یک سند منبع طولانی را در یک جمع\u200cآوری تکرار و کنترل کنیم. با وجود پیشرفت در تکنیک\u200cهای مدل\u200cسازی، مدل\u200cهای جمع\u200cسازی abstractive هنوز از چند چالش\u200cهای کلیدی رنج می\u200cبرند: (i) پیشرفت\u200cهای برنامه\u200cسازی: آنها به سبک آموزش شرکت\u200cسازی زیادی مناسب هستند. (ii) محدودیت abstractivity محدودیت: آنها برای کاپیتان n گرم از منبع به جای تولید جمعیت\u200cهای abstractive نویس optimized می\u200cشوند; (iii) فقدان شفافیت: قابل تعبیر نیستند. در این کار، ما یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچ برای این موقع، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cدهیم که بستگی\u200cهای latent و explicit در جمله\u200cها در سند منبع در مدل\u200cهای جمع کردن یک سند به پایان پایان دهیم. چهارچوب ما مدل\u200cهای جمع کردن استاندارد\u200cدهنده\u200cی رمزبندی\u200cها را با افزایش آنها با نمایش\u200cهای سند آگاه ساختمان ثروتمند بر اساس ساختمان\u200cهای علم (اخیر) و ساختمان\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی (مشخص) خارجی تعلیم می\u200cکند. ما نشان می دهیم که چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها', 'sw': 'Ujumbe wa maandishi yenye uharibifu unakusudia kuingiza taarifa za nyaraka ndefu za vyanzo katika muhtasari ulioandaliwa tena. Pamoja na maendeleo katika mbinu za kutengeneza miundo mbinu, mifumo ya muhtasari bado yanakabiliwa na changamoto kadhaa za muhimu: (i) kutengeneza upendeleo: wanatumia mbinu za mafunzo; (二) Ubaguzi wa kujitegemea kidogo: wanawezekana kulinuka vipande na vipande kutoka chanzo badala ya kutengeneza muhtasari wa riwaya zisizo na maanani; (iii) ukosefu wa uwazi: hawawezi tafsiri. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza mfumo unaotengenezwa na muundo wa kiwango cha dokumentari kwa ajili ya ufuatiliaji wa muhtasari wa kukabiliana na changamoto hizi. To this end, we propose incorporating latent and explicit dependencies across sentences in the source document into end-to-end single-document summarization models.  Mifumo yetu inachanganya mifano ya ukodi wa ukodi wa kiwango cha ukodi kwa kuongeza kwa uwakilishi wa nyaraka za ujenzi wenye ufahamu wa taarifa kwa kutumia miundombinu ya hivi karibuni na miundombinu ya lugha ya nje. Tunaonyesha kuwa mfumo wetu wa muhtasari, umefundishwa kwenye seti ya taarifa za CNN/DM, unaboresha taarifa za maudhui katika nyaraka za vyanzo, hutengeneza muhtasari wa kutosha zaidi kwa kutengeneza vipindi vya riwaya na viwango vingi vya habari, na pia hujumuisha miundo mbinu yenye kiwango cha hukumu, wakati wa kufanya kazi kwa viwanja vya kawaida.', 'tr': 'Abstraktiw metin holasasy üçin uzun çeşme senediň maglumatyny gaýd etmek üçin amaçlarýar. Modellemek tekniklerde ösümlikler ýöne, abstraktiw toparlama modelleri birnäçe möhüm kynçylyklardan çykyp barýarlar: (i) taýýarlama terbiyesi: ol korpora okuwçylygyň stiline ösümliýär; (ii) çykarylyk çykarylyklykyny: bu gyzykly (n-gramler) kitaplardan kopyalamak üçin optimizalýar; bu gyzykly (n) (iii) Durjalyk ýetmedi: beýle terjime edip bilmeýärler. Bu işde, bu kynçylyklary çözmek üçin desktap derejesiniň strukturyna daýanýan bir çerçew teklip edip görýäris. Bu üçin, çeşme senediň içine soňky we açık bağlyklaryny tek-soňra sened jemzalamasynyň nusgasyna dahyl etmegi teklip edýäris. Biziň çerýämiz standart kodçy-dekoderlemek nusgalaryny daňlap baý struktur bilen bilinen sened döredilmeleri iň bellenen (geçmiş) strukturlaryň we daşary-taýýarlanan lingwistiki (explicit) strukturlaryň üstine daýanýar. Biz CNN/DM datasetinde eğitilän jemgyýetleme framlarymyzy görkez, çeşme senediň meselelerini üýtgedýän, Daha bir n-gramlary döredip, we sözlem derejesinde terjime edilebilir döredilýän jemgyýetleri çykarýar we bellenen baýramlar bilen üýtgedýän jemgyýetleri çykarýar.', 'sq': 'Përshkrimi abstraktiv i tekstit synon të kompresojë informacionin e një dokumenti të gjatë burimi në një përmbledhje të përsëritur, të kondensatuar. Pavarësisht nga përparimet në teknikat e modelimit, modelet abstraktive të përmbledhjes ende vuajnë nga disa sfida kyçe: (i) paragjykimi i përcaktimit: ato përshtaten shumë në stilin e korprës së trajnimit; (ii) abstraktiviteti i kufizuar: ato optimizohen për kopjimin e n-grameve nga burimi n ë vend që të krijojnë përmbledhje abstraktive të reja; iii) mungesa e transparencës: ato nuk janë të interpretueshme. Në këtë punë, ne propozojmë një kuadër bazuar në nxitjen e strukturës në nivel të dokumentit për përmbledhje për të trajtuar këto sfida. To this end, we propose incorporating latent and explicit dependencies across sentences in the source document into end-to-end single-document summarization models.  Korniza jonë komplementon modelet standard të përmbledhjes së koduesit-dekoderit duke i shtuar ato me përfaqësime të pasura të dokumenteve të ndërgjegjshme për strukturat bazuar në struktura të mësuara implicitisht (të fshehta) dhe struktura gjuhësore (të shprehura) të nxjerra jashtë. Ne tregojmë se kuadri ynë i përmbledhjes, i stërvitur n ë bazën e të dhënave CNN/DM, përmirëson mbulimin e përmbajtjes në dokumentet e burimit, gjeneron përmbledhje më abstrakte duke gjeneruar më shumë n-gram të reja dhe përfshin struktura të interpretueshme të nivelit të fjalëve, ndërsa funksionon në përputhje me linjat bazë standarte.', 'af': "Abstraktiewe teks opsomming doel om die inligting van 'n lang bron dokument in' n herhaalde, kondenseerde opsomming te komprimeer. Alhoewel voorspoedige in modellering teknike, abstraktiewe opsommingsmodele lyk nog steeds van verskeie sleutel uitdagings: i) uitleg voorspoedige: hulle oorspoedig na die styl van onderwerp korpora; (ii) beperk abstraktiviteit: hulle is optimaliseer om n-grame van die bron te kopieer as om novel abstraktiewe opsommings te genereer; en (iii) die ontbreek van deursigtigheid: hulle is nie verduidelik nie. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n raamwerk gebaseer op dokumentvlak struktuur induksie vir opsomming om hierdie uitdagings te adres. Op hierdie einde, voorstel ons om latente en eksplisiese afhanklikhede te inkorporeer oor setinge in die bron dokument in einde- na- einde enkel- dokument opsomming modele te maak. Ons raamwerk complementeer standaard enkoder-dekoder opsommingsmodele deur hulle te groei met ryk struktuur-bevestig dokument voorstellings gebaseer op inplisite geleerde (latent) strukture en eksterne afgeleerde lingvisiese (explicit) strukture. Ons wys dat ons opsomming raamwerk, onderwerp op die CNN/DM-datastel, verbeter die dekking van inhoud in die bron-dokumente, genereer meer abstraktiewe opsommings deur meer novele n-grame te genereer, en inkorpreer uitleggbare setvlak-strukture, terwyl op par met standaard basisline uitvoer.", 'hy': 'Աբստրակտիվ տեքստի համառոտագրությունը նպատակում է երկար աղբյուր փաստաթղթի տեղեկատվությունը ընդգծել վերաբացատրված, կոնդենսացված համառոտագրությամբ: Despite advances in modeling techniques, abstractive summarization models still suffer from several key challenges: (i) layout bias: they overfit to the style of training corpora;  (II) սահմանափակ վերացրատիվությունը. դրանք օպտիմացված են n-գրամ կոպիանելու աղբյուրից, ոչ թե նոր վերացրատիվ համառոտագրություններ ստեղծելու համար: (III) թափանցիկության պակաս: Դրանք չեն կարող մեկնաբանել: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք մի շրջանակ, որը հիմնված է փաստաթղթի մակարդակի կառուցվածքի ինդուկցիայի վրա համառոտագրման համար այս մարտահրավերների լուծման համար: Այսպիսով, մենք առաջարկում ենք ներառել թաքնված և ակնհայտ կախվածությունները նախադասությունների միջև աղբյուր փաստաթղթի մեջ վերջ-վերջ մեկ փաստաթղթի համառոտագրման մոդելների մեջ: Մեր կառուցվածքը համալրացնում է ստանդարտ կոդեր-կոդեր համառոտագրման մոդելները՝ աճելով դրանք հարուստ կառուցվածքի գիտակցած փաստաթղթերի ներկայացումներով, հիմնված անխուսափելի սովորված (թաքնված) կառուցվածքների և արտաքին լեզվաբանական Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր համառոտագրման կառուցվածքը, որը պատրաստված է CNN-ի և DM-ի տվյալների համակարգում, բարելավում է աղբյուրների փաստաթղթերի պարունակությունը, ստեղծում է ավելի վերացական համառոտագրություններ ստեղծելով նորարար n-գրամեր, ներառում է թարգմանելի նախադասությունների մակարդակի կառուցվածքն', 'am': 'የጽሑፍ አቀማመጥ የረጅም የኩነቶች ሰነዱን አቀማመጥ ማቀናጃ ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን በሞዴል ልቅናዎች ላይ ቢሆን፣ የውጤት አካባቢ ማሳየት ሞዴል ግን ከቁልፎች ጥያቄዎች መከራ ይቀበላል:(i) የጥያቄ ጥያቄ: ወደ ትምህርት ኮርፖርት ዘይት ይለቅሳሉ፡ (ii) limited abstractiveness: they are optimized to copying n-grams from the source rather than generating novel abstractive summaries;  (iii) የግልፅ ጉዳይ የለውም፤ አይተረጉም። በዚህ ሥራ፣ የሰነድ-ደረጃን ግንኙነት ለመቆጣጠር የሥርዓት ጉዳዮች ለመጠየቅ የሚደረገውን ፍሬማር እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ለዚህ ምክንያት አዲስ እና ግልፅ ማሳየት እና በአሁኑ ሰነድ ውስጥ ባለው ክፍተቶችን በመጨመር እናስጠጋለን፡፡ የሥርዓታችን አካባቢ አካባቢ እና የውጭ ቋንቋዎች (explicit) ሥርዓቶች በተመሠረቱት ሀብታም የተታወቀ ሰነድ መልዕክቶችን በመጨመር ይጨምርባቸዋል፡፡ የCNN/DM ዳታ ማድረጊያውን እንዳስተማርነው እናሳየዋለን፥ የኩነቶች ሰነዶች ውስጥ የሚኖረውን ክፍተት ያበጅላል፣ የበዛ የኖሮው የ-ግራም ክፍተቶችን በመፍጠር እና በተጨማሪው የክፍል-ደረጃን መሠረቶች እና በዓላማዊ መሠረት በመስመር ላይ በተጨማሪው ጥያቄ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'ko': '요약 텍스트 요약은 긴 원본 문서의 정보를 다시 사용한 간략한 요약으로 압축하는 데 목적을 둔다.비록 모델링 기술이 진보했지만 추상적 요약 모델은 여전히 몇 가지 관건적인 도전에 직면하고 있다. (i) 구조 편차: 그들은 훈련 자료 라이브러리의 스타일에 지나치게 적응한다.(ii) 유한한 추상성: 새로운 추상적 요약을 만드는 것이 아니라 원본 코드에서 n-gram을 복제하는 것으로 최적화된다.(3) 투명도 결핍: 그것들은 해석할 수 없다.이 작업에서 우리는 문서급 구조의 귀납을 바탕으로 하는 총결산 구조를 제시하여 이러한 도전에 대응했다.이를 위해 원본 문서에서 문장 간의 잠재적 의존과 현시적 의존을 끝까지 단일 문서 요약 모델에 통합하는 것을 권장합니다.우리의 프레임워크는 스텔스 학습(잠재적) 구조와 외부 파생 언어(현식) 구조를 바탕으로 하는 풍부한 구조 감지 문서 표시를 통해 표준 인코더-디코더 요약 모델을 보충한다.우리는 CNN/DM 데이터 집합에서 훈련한 요약 프레임워크를 보여 주었고 원본 문서의 내용의 커버율을 높였다. 더 많은 새로운 n-gram을 생성함으로써 더 많은 추상적인 요약을 생성했고 해석 가능한 문장급 구조를 결합시켰으며 표준 기선과 비슷했다.', 'az': 'Abstraktiv mətn qurğulaması uzun mənbə dökümünün məlumatını yenidən dəyişdirilmiş, condensed toplamına sıkıştırmaq məqsədilədir. modellik tekniklərin avanslarına baxmayaraq, abstraktiv toplama modellərinin çoxlu açar çətinliklərdən əziyyət çəkir: i) düzəltmə bias ı: onlar korpora təhsil moduna uyğun deyillər; ii) xərcləndirilən abstraktiv: yeni abstraktiv toplamlar yaratmaq yerinə n-gramləri mənbədən kopyalamaq üçün optimizlənir; (iii) Şəfəqiyyət yoxdur: onlar yoxdur. Bu işdə, bu çətinliklərdən çəkinmək üçün səhifələr-seviyyəti strukturlarına dayanan bir framework ə təklif edirik. Bu səbəbdə, təkrar-təkrar təkrar-təkrar təkrar-təkrar təkrar-təkrar təkrar-təkrar təkrar-təkrar təkrarlama modellerinə sözlərin arasındakı latent və açıq bağlılıqlarını təklif edirik. Bizim qurğumuz standart kodlayıcı-dekoder yığışdırma modellərini artırar, onları dövrünün öyrənmiş (sonrakı) quruluşların və dış dilindəki (açıq-aydın) quruluşların təsdiqlənməsinə dayandırır. Biz CNN/DM verilənlərdə təhsil edilən qurğumuzun, mənbə belələrində məlumatların örtüsün ü yaxşılaşdırır, daha yeni n-gramlar yaratmaq üçün daha çox abstraktiv toplamlar yaradır, və cümlələr səviyyəsində təfsil edilə bilən quruluşlar birlikdə standart səviyyələrlə birlikdə işlədirir.', 'cs': 'Abstrakční shrnutí textu má za cíl komprimovat informace z dlouhého zdrojového dokumentu do přeformulovaného, zkompenzovaného shrnutí. Navzdory pokroku v modelovacích technikách, abstraktivní souhrnné modely stále trpí několika klíčovými výzvami: (i) zaujatostí rozložení: přesahují styl tréninkových korpusů; ii) omezená abstraktivita: jsou optimalizovány pro kopírování n-gramů ze zdroje spíše než pro generování nových abstraktivních shrnutí; iii) nedostatek transparentnosti: nejsou interpretovatelné. V této práci navrhujeme rámec založený na indukci struktury na úrovni dokumentů pro shrnutí těchto výzev. Za tímto účelem navrhujeme začlenění latentních a explicitních závislostí napříč větami ve zdrojovém dokumentu do komplexních modelů souhrnu jednoho dokumentu. Náš framework doplňuje standardní souhrnné modely kodéru-dekodéru tím, že je rozšíří o bohaté strukturově orientované reprezentace dokumentů založené na implicitně učených (latentních) struktur a externě odvozených lingvistických (explicitních) struktur. Ukazujeme, že náš souhrnný framework, trénovaný na datové sadě CNN/DM, zlepšuje pokrytí obsahu ve zdrojových dokumentech, generuje abstraktivnější souhrny generováním více nových n-gramů a zahrnuje interpretovatelné struktury na úrovni vět, přičemž funguje stejně jako standardní základní linie.', 'bn': 'সংক্ষেপের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে একটি দীর্ঘ উৎসের তথ্য সম্পূর্ণ সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপে পুনঃসংক্ষিপ্ত, সংক্ষ মডেলিং প্রযুক্তির উন্নয়ন সত্ত্বেও, বেশ কয়েকটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ চ্যালেঞ্জ থেকে অস্বীকৃতিক সংক্রান্ত মডেল এখনও কষ্ট পাচ্ছে: (i) ল (ii) সীমিত অস্বীকার কর্মকাণ্ড: সোর্স থেকে এন-গ্রাম অনুলিপি করার ক্ষেত্রে তাদের সাধারণ সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপ তৈরি করার পরিবর্ (ই) স্বচ্ছতার অভাব: তারা ব্যাখ্যা করে না। এই কাজে আমরা ডকুমেন্ট-স্তরের কাঠামোর উপর ভিত্তিক একটি ফ্রেম কাঠামো প্রস্তাব করছি এই চ্যালেঞ্জের কথা বলার জন্য। এই পর্যন্ত আমরা সাম্প্রতিক এবং সুস্পষ্ট বাক্যের প্রতি নির্ভর করার প্রস্তাব করছি সূত্রের নথির শেষ-শেষে এক নথিপত্রের সংক্ষেপ মডেলে শে আমাদের ফ্রেমের সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত মডেল বাড়িয়ে দিয়ে তাদের সমৃদ্ধ কাঠামো পরিচিত নথির প্রতিনিধিত্বের মাধ্যমে যুক্ আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের সংক্ষেপের ফ্রেম, সিএনএন/ডিএম ডাটাসেটে প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে, সূত্র নথির বিষয়বস্তুর কাভারেজ উন্নত করে, আরো নোভেল এন-গ্রাম তৈরি করে আরো বেশি সংক্ষেপ তৈরি করে এব', 'ca': "La resumensió abstracta del text té l'objectiu de comprimir la informació d'un document de llarg origen en un resum reesformat i condensat. Malgrat els avanços en les tècniques de modelació, els models abstractes de resum encara pateixen varis reptes clau: i) bias de distribució: s'encaixen per l'estil de formació corporal; ii) abstractivitat limitada: són optimitzats per copiar n-grams de la font en comptes de generar noves resumes abstractius; iii) falta de transparència: no són interpretables. En aquesta feina, proposem un marc basat en l'inducció de l'estructura a nivell documental per a resumir aquests reptes. A tal efecte, proposem incorporar dependencies latents i explícites entre frases al document de font en models de resum d'un únic document de final a final. Our framework complements standard encoder-decoder summarization models by augmenting them with rich structure-aware document representations based on implicitly learned (latent) structures and externally-derived linguistic (explicit) structures.  Mostrem que el nostre marc de sumarització, entrenat en el conjunt de dades CNN/DM, millora la cobertura del contingut en els documents de font, genera resumes més abstracts generant n-grams més noves, i incorpora estructures interpretables de nivell de frases, mentre actua de la mateixa manera que les línies de base estándar.", 'bs': 'Abstraktivna sažetka teksta cilja je kompresirati informacije dugog izvorskog dokumenta u rephrazirani, kondensirani sažetak. Uprkos napretku u modeliranim tehnikama, modeli abstraktivne sažetke još uvijek pate od nekoliko ključnih izazova: i) predrasude za raspored: oni su premladni stilu treninga korporacije; ii) ograničena abstraktivnost: optimizirana su na kopiranje n-grama iz izvora umjesto stvaranja novih abstraktivnih sažetaka; iii) nedostatak transparentnosti: oni ne mogu interpretirati. U ovom poslu predlažemo okvir na temelju indukcije strukture na nivou dokumenta za sažetak kako bi se riješili ovi izazovi. Za taj cilj predlažemo uključivanje latentne i ekskluzivne zavisnosti preko rečenica iz izvornog dokumenta u modele sažetke jednodokumenta do kraja. Naš okvir dopunjava standardne modele sažetke kodera-dekodera povećavajući ih sa bogatim predstavljanjima dokumenta koji su svjesni strukturom na temelju implicitno naučenih (latentnih) struktura i vanjskih jezičkih struktura. Pokazujemo da naš okvir za sažetak, obučen na CNN/DM-u, poboljšava pokrivanje sadržaja u izvornim dokumentima, stvara apstraktivnije sažetke stvaranjem novih n-grama, i uključuje strukture na razini rečenica, dok se izvodi na par sa standardnim osnovnim linijama.', 'fi': 'Tiivistelmän tarkoituksena on tiivistää pitkän lähdeasiakirjan tiedot uudelleen muotoilluksi tiivistetyksi tiivistetyksi. Mallinnustekniikoiden kehityksestä huolimatta abstraktit yhteenvetomallit kärsivät edelleen useista keskeisistä haasteista: (i) asettelun vääristymisestä: ne ylittävät koulutuscorporan tyylin; ii) rajallinen abstraktisuus: ne on optimoitu kopioimaan n-grammaa lähteestä sen sijaan, että ne tuottaisivat uusia abstraktiivisia yhteenvetoja; iii) avoimuuden puute: niitä ei voida tulkita. Tässä työssä ehdotamme asiakirjatason rakenteen induktioon perustuvaa kehystä näiden haasteiden ratkaisemiseksi. Tätä tarkoitusta varten ehdotamme, että lähdedokumentin lauseiden piilevät ja eksplisiittiset riippuvuudet sisällytetään yhden asiakirjan yhteenvetomalleihin. Kehyksemme täydentää standardikoodaaja-dekooderi-yhteenvetomalleja lisäämällä niitä rikkailla rakenteeseen perustuvilla asiakirjaesityksillä, jotka perustuvat implisiittisesti opittuihin (piileviin) rakenteisiin ja ulkoisesti johdettuihin kielellisiin (eksplisiittisiin) rakenteisiin. Osoitamme, että CNN/DM-aineistoon koulutettu tiivistelmäkehys parantaa lähdedokumenttien sisällön kattavuutta, tuottaa abstraktiivisempia tiivistelmiä tuottamalla uusia n-grammeja ja sisältää tulkittavissa olevia lausetason rakenteita, samalla kun se toimii standardilähtökohtien mukaisesti.', 'et': 'Kokkuvõtliku teksti kokkuvõtte eesmärk on tihendada pika lähtedokumendi informatsioon ümbersõnastatud kokkuvõtteks. Vaatamata modelleerimistehnikate edusammudele kannatavad abstraktsed kokkuvõtlusmudelid endiselt mitme peamise väljakutse all: i) paigutuse kallutamine: need sobivad üle koolituskorporate stiilile; ii) piiratud abstraktsus: need on optimeeritud n-grammide kopeerimiseks allikast, mitte uute abstraktsete kokkuvõtete loomiseks; iii) läbipaistvuse puudumine: need ei ole tõlgendatavad. Käesolevas töös pakume välja raamistiku, mis põhineb dokumenditasemel struktuuri induktsioonil kokkuvõtlikuks tegemiseks nende probleemide lahendamiseks. Selleks teeme ettepaneku lisada lähtedokumendi lausete latentsed ja selgesõnalised sõltuvused lõpust lõpuni ühe dokumendi kokkuvõtlusmudelitesse. Meie raamistik täiendab standardseid kodeerija-dekooderi kokkuvõtlusmudeleid, täiendades neid rikkalike struktuuriteadlike dokumentide esitustega, mis põhinevad kaudselt õppitud (latentsetel) struktuuridel ja väliselt tuletatud keelelistel (eksplitsetel) struktuuridel. Näitame, et meie CNN/DM andmekogumil koolitatud kokkuvõtlusraamistik parandab lähtedokumentide sisu katvust, genereerib abstraktsemaid kokkuvõtteid, genereerib rohkem uudseid n-gramme ning sisaldab tõlgendatavaid lausetaseme struktuure, toimides samal ajal standardite alusjoontega võrdselt.', 'sk': 'Cilj povzetka besedila je stisniti informacije dolgega izvornega dokumenta v preoblikovan, zgoščen povzetek. Kljub napredku v tehnikah modeliranja se abstraktivni modeli povzetka še vedno soočajo z več ključnimi izzivi: (i) pristranskostjo postavitve: presegajo slog usposabljanja korpusov; (ii) omejena abstraktivnost: optimizirani so za kopiranje n-gramov iz vira in ne za ustvarjanje novih abstraktivnih povzetkov; (iii) pomanjkanje preglednosti: niso razložljive. V tem delu predlagamo okvir, ki temelji na indukciji strukture na ravni dokumenta za povzetek za reševanje teh izzivov. V ta namen predlagamo vključitev latentnih in eksplicitnih odvisnosti med stavki v izvornem dokumentu v modele za povzetek enega dokumenta. Naš okvir dopolnjuje standardne modele povzetka kodirnikov-dekoderjev, tako da jih dopolnjuje z bogatimi strukturnimi predstavitvami dokumentov, ki temeljijo na implicitno učenih (latentnih) strukturah in zunanjih izpeljanih jezikovnih (eksplicitnih) strukturah. Pokazujemo, da naš okvir za povzetek, usposobljen na podatkovnem naboru CNN/DM, izboljšuje pokritost vsebine v izvornih dokumentih, ustvarja bolj abstraktivne povzetke z ustvarjanjem več novih n-gramov in vključuje razložljive strukture stavkov, hkrati pa deluje enako kot standardne osnovne črte.', 'ha': "Kurarinsa na matsayin na destractive yana aimar ya underline information of a long source document zuwa a restorated, sami da aka samu. Bayan taƙaitaccen masu motsi cikin masu motsi, misãlai masu ƙararin tsohon mutane na daidai a ƙarami: (i) Suna shige shi zuwa tsarin mafarin makampuni; @ info: whatsthis Bã su da fatauci, kuma bã su yin fassarar magana. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗa wani firam a kan ƙanshi na tsarin-daraja na takardar da za'a samu'a zuwa masu saka wa masu kanana. Ga wannan, Munã goyyade in shigar da masu inganci na farko da bayani masu bayyani a cikin takardan kwanza zuwa ƙari-ƙari ga samun ƙararin takardar guda. @ action: button Tuna n ũna cewa firam masu ƙararin da aka yi wa tsarin CNN/DM, yana ƙari tsarin maɓallin cikin takardun kwanan-kwanan, yana ƙara ƙari masu kanana da tsari na-gram, kuma yana shigar da tsarin da za'a fasahar da fassarar-daraja, a lokacin da za'a yi amfani da par da layin bango na daidaita.", 'jv': 'Cumulates politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive (ii) limitation (iii) Gak Mangke Keteraransi: kepengin ora oleh operasi. Nang lan iki, kita supoyo sistem sing basa supoyo cah-cah dumadhi kanggo resmi dadi iki dadi apik. Saiki iki, kita ndhukung nggawe mulai nggawe gambar perusahaan logi lan banjur-perusahaan langkung sampeyan karo nggawe Dokumen buktuan sampek model sing suku end-to-end single-document Kita andhaduk kompliment Standard koder-decoder sumulasi model ngewehi nggawe bagian structural-awake dokumen representations basa karo impelimutan uga (LATTAN) structural lan externly-mined language (explicitis) structural. Awak dhéwé éntukno resmi dadi, ditambahak akeh lan dataset nggawe kontribusi tarjamah lan dokumen sing perusahaan, ngregani kapan kucpulan dumateng, dadi nggawe sistem sing luwih dumateng n-gram, lan akeh dumateng kapan-perusahaan senegal dumateng, uga iso dianggap tarjamahan dumateng maneh.', 'he': 'סכם טקסט אסטרקטיבי מכוון ללחץ את המידע של מסמך מקור ארוך לתוך סכם מחדש, מעורפל. למרות התקדמות בטכניקות הדוגמניות, דוגמנים אסטרקטיביים של סאמריזציה עדיין סובלים מכמה אתגרים מפתחיים: (ii) אסטרקטיבות מוגבלת: הן אופטימיות לעתק n-גרם מהמקור במקום ליצור סדרות אסטרקטיביות חדשות; (iii) חוסר שקיפות: הם לא ניתן לפרש. In this work, we propose a framework based on document-level structure induction for summarization to address these challenges.  למטרה זו, אנו מציעים להכניס תלויות מוסתרות וברורות בין המשפטים במסמך המקור למודלים של מסמך יחיד בסוף לסוף. המסגרת שלנו תוספת מודלים סטנדרטיים של סכם קודד-קידור על ידי גידול אותם עם מייצגי מסמכים עשירים מודעים למבנה המבוססים על מבנים ללמודים (מוסתרים) ובמבנים שפותיים (מוחלטים) שנוצרים מבחוץ. אנו מראים שמסגרת הסיוריזציה שלנו, מאומנת על קבוצת נתונים CNN/DM, משפר את הכיסוי של התוכן במסמכים המקורים, יוצרת סכם אסטרקטיבי יותר על ידי ליצור n-גרם נוספים, ומכילה מבנים ברמה משפטים אפשריים, בזמן שהופעה באופן שווה עם קווי הבסיס סטנדרטיים.', 'bo': 'Abstractive text summarization aims to compressing the information of a long source document into a rephrased, condensed summary. དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་དབུགས་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་ཁབ་ཅིག་ཡོད་ཀྱང་མཐོང་ན། (ii) འཕགས་རླུང་ཚད་limitེ་ བྱས་པ་ཡིན། (iii) འཕགས་རིས་བྱས་མི་འདུག། དེ་དག་ནི་ཕན་ཚོར་ཕན་ཆེན་མི་ཐུབ་པ། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་ཆ་གི་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་དབུགས་རྩིས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ནི་ལྟ་བུ་བསམ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་ཞིག་དང་། མཇུག་དུ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཐོག་མའི་ཡིག་ཆ་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་མཁན་དང་གསལ་བཤད་རྐྱེན་ཁག་ཅིག་བསྡུར་ན་བསམ་འཆར་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་རེད། Our framework complements standard encoder-decoder summarization models by augmenting them with rich structure-aware document representations based on implicitly learned (latent) structures and externally-derived linguistic (explicit) structures. We show that our summarization framework, trained on the CNN/DM dataset, improves the coverage of content in the source documents, generates more abstractive summaries by generating more novel n-grams, and incorporates interpretable sentence-level structures, while performing on par with standard baselines.'}
{'en': 'LSOIE : A Large-Scale Dataset for Supervised Open Information Extraction', 'ar': 'LSOIE: مجموعة بيانات واسعة النطاق لاستخراج المعلومات المفتوحة الخاضعة للإشراف', 'pt': 'LSOIE: um conjunto de dados em grande escala para extração supervisionada de informações abertas', 'fr': "LSOIE\xa0: un jeu de données à grande échelle pour l'extraction ouverte d'informations supervis", 'es': 'LSOIE: Un conjunto de datos a gran escala para la extracción de información abierta supervisada', 'ja': 'LSOIE ：監視されたオープン情報抽出のための大規模データセット', 'hi': 'LSOIE: पर्यवेक्षित खुली जानकारी निष्कर्षण के लिए एक बड़े पैमाने पर डेटासेट', 'zh': 'LSOIE:用监督式开信提取大集', 'ru': 'LSOIE: Крупномасштабный набор данных для контролируемого извлечения открытой информации', 'ga': 'LSOIE: Tacar Sonraí ar Mhórscála le haghaidh Eastóscadh Faisnéise Oscailte Maoirsithe', 'ka': 'LSOIE', 'hu': 'LSOIE: Egy nagyméretű adatkészlet a felügyelt nyílt információk kitermeléséhez', 'el': 'Ένα σύνολο δεδομένων μεγάλης κλίμακας για εποπτευόμενη ανοικτή εξαγωγή πληροφοριών', 'it': "LSOIE: un set di dati su larga scala per l'estrazione di informazioni aperte supervisionate", 'kk': 'LSOIE: Бақылайтын ашық мәліметті тарқату үшін үлкен масштабтау деректер бағдарламасы', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'LSOIE: സൂപ്പര്\u200dവ്വദര്\u200dശിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വലിയ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്', 'lt': 'LSOIE: Didelio masto duomenų rinkinys, skirtas kontroliuojamai atviros informacijos ekstrakcijai', 'ms': 'LSOIE: Set Data Skala Besar untuk Ekstraksi Maklumat Buka Tersupervisi', 'mn': 'LSOIE: Хэрэглэгдсэн нээлттэй мэдээллийн хайлтын том хэмжээний өгөгдлийн санг', 'mt': 'LSOIE: Sett ta’ Dejta fuq skala kbira għall-Estrazzjoni ta’ Informazzjoni Miftuħa Superviża', 'pl': 'LSOIE: Duży zestaw danych do nadzorowanej ekstrakcji otwartych informacji', 'ro': 'LSOIE: Un set de date la scară largă pentru extragerea informațiilor deschise supravegheate', 'sr': 'LSOIE: Velika skala podataka za nadzornu ekstrakciju otvorene informacije', 'no': 'LSOIE: Eit stor skala databaser for oversikt utpakking av opna informasjon', 'si': 'LSOIE: විශාල තොරතුරු නිරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ලොකු ස්කල් දත්ත සැකසුම්', 'ur': 'LSOIE: Supervised Open Information Extraction کے لئے ایک بڑا- اسکیل ڈاٹس', 'sv': 'LSOIE: En storskalig datauppsättning för övervakad utvinning av öppen information', 'so': 'LSOIE: Warbixinta macluumaadka furan', 'ta': 'LSOIE: சேர்க்கப்பட்ட திறந்த தகவல் வெளியீட்டுக்கான ஒரு பெரிய அளவு- தகவல் அமைப்பு', 'uz': 'LSOIE: A Large-Scale Dataset for Supervised Open Information Extraction', 'vi': 'LSD: A Large-Scale dataset for giám sát Open Information extracttion', 'hr': 'LSOIE: Velika skala podataka za izvlačenje nadzorne otvorene informacije', 'bg': 'LSOIE: Голям набор от данни за контролирано извличане на отворена информация', 'nl': 'LSOIE: Een grootschalige dataset voor supervised open informatie extractie', 'da': 'LSOIE: Et stort datasæt til overvåget udtrækning af åben information', 'id': 'LSOIE: Sebuah Set Data Skala Besar untuk Ekstraksi Informasi Buka Tersupervisi', 'de': 'LSOIE: Ein großer Datensatz für die überwachte Open Information Extraction', 'fa': 'LSOIE: یک اطلاعات مقیاس بزرگ برای اخراج اطلاعات باز تحت نظر', 'ko': 'LSOIE: 개방된 정보 추출을 감독하기 위한 대규모 데이터 세트', 'sw': 'LSOIE: Taarifa kubwa kwa ajili ya utoaji habari za wazi', 'tr': 'fs-type', 'af': 'Description', 'sq': 'LSOIE: Një bazë të dhënash me shkallë të madhe për nxjerrjen e informacionit të hapur të mbikqyrur', 'hy': 'ԼՍՕԻ՝ Անտեսված բաց տեղեկատվության արտահանման մեծ մասշտաբով տվյալների համակարգ', 'am': 'undo-type', 'az': 'LSOIE: Supervised Open Information Extraction 칲칞칲n B칲y칲k 칬l칞칲 veril톛n veril톛nl톛r', 'bn': 'LSOIE: Supervied open info Extraction for Large- Scale Dataset', 'bs': 'LSOIE: Velika skala podataka za nadzornu ekstrakciju otvorene informacije', 'ca': 'LSOIE: Un conjunt de dades a gran escala per a extrair informació oberta supervisada', 'et': 'LSOIE: laiaulatuslik andmekogum järelevalvega avatud teabe väljavõtmiseks', 'cs': 'LSOIE: Rozsáhlá sada dat pro kontrolovanou otevřenou extrakci informací', 'fi': 'LSOIE: Laajamittainen tietojoukko valvottua avointa tiedonhankintaa varten', 'jv': 'checkbox', 'sk': 'LSOIE: obsežni nabor podatkov za nadzorovano odprto pridobivanje informacij', 'he': 'Name', 'bo': 'LSOIE: Supervised Open Information Extraction for Large-Scale Dataset', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name'}
{'en': 'Open Information Extraction (OIE) systems seek to compress the factual propositions of a sentence into a series of n-ary tuples. These tuples are useful for downstream tasks in natural language processing like knowledge base creation, textual entailment, and natural language understanding. However, current OIE datasets are limited in both size and diversity. We introduce a new dataset by converting the QA-SRL 2.0 dataset to a large-scale OIE dataset LSOIE. Our LSOIE dataset is 20 times larger than the next largest human-annotated OIE dataset. We construct and evaluate several benchmark OIE models on LSOIE, providing baselines for future improvements on the task. Our LSOIE data, models, and code are made publicly available.', 'ar': 'تسعى أنظمة استخراج المعلومات المفتوحة (OIE) إلى ضغط المقترحات الواقعية للجملة في سلسلة من مجموعات n-ary. هذه المجموعات مفيدة لمهام المصب في معالجة اللغة الطبيعية مثل إنشاء قاعدة المعرفة ، والاستلزام النصي ، وفهم اللغة الطبيعية. ومع ذلك ، فإن مجموعات البيانات الحالية لمنظمة OIE محدودة من حيث الحجم والتنوع. نقدم مجموعة بيانات جديدة عن طريق تحويل مجموعة بيانات QA-SRL 2.0 إلى مجموعة بيانات واسعة النطاق من OIE LSOIE. تعد مجموعة بيانات LSOIE الخاصة بنا أكبر 20 مرة من أكبر مجموعة بيانات OIE التالية التي تم شرحها بشريًا. نقوم بإنشاء وتقييم العديد من نماذج OIE المعيارية على LSOIE ، مما يوفر خطوطًا أساسية للتحسينات المستقبلية على المهمة. يتم إتاحة بيانات ونماذج ورموز LSOIE الخاصة بنا للجمهور.', 'pt': 'Os sistemas Open Information Extraction (OIE) procuram comprimir as proposições factuais de uma sentença em uma série de tuplas n-árias. Essas tuplas são úteis para tarefas downstream no processamento de linguagem natural, como criação de base de conhecimento, vinculação textual e compreensão de linguagem natural. No entanto, os conjuntos de dados atuais da OIE são limitados em tamanho e diversidade. Introduzimos um novo conjunto de dados convertendo o conjunto de dados QA-SRL 2.0 em um conjunto de dados OIE de grande escala LSOIE. Nosso conjunto de dados LSOIE é 20 vezes maior do que o próximo maior conjunto de dados OIE anotado por humanos. Construímos e avaliamos vários modelos OIE de referência no LSOIE, fornecendo linhas de base para futuras melhorias na tarefa. Nossos dados, modelos e código LSOIE são disponibilizados publicamente.', 'fr': "Les systèmes Open Information Extraction (OIE) cherchent à compresser les propositions factuelles d'une phrase en une série de n-uplets. Ces tuples sont utiles pour les tâches en aval dans le traitement du langage naturel, comme la création d'une base de connaissances, l'implication textuelle et la compréhension du langage naturel. Cependant, les ensembles de données actuels de l'OIE sont limités tant par leur taille que par leur diversité. Nous introduisons un nouveau jeu de données en convertissant le jeu de données QA-SRL 2.0 en un ensemble de données de l'OIE à grande échelle L Notre ensemble de données LSOIE est 20 fois plus grand que le plus grand ensemble de données de l'OIE annoté par des humains. Nous construisons et évaluons plusieurs modèles de référence de l'OIE sur LSOIE, fournissant des bases pour les améliorations futures de la tâche. Nos données, modèles et code LSOIE sont mis à la disposition du public.", 'es': 'Los sistemas de Extracción Abierta de Información (OIE) buscan comprimir las proposiciones fácticas de una oración en una serie de tuplas n-arias. Estas tuplas son útiles para tareas posteriores en el procesamiento del lenguaje natural, como la creación de bases de conocimientos, la implicación textual y la comprensión del lenguaje natural. Sin embargo, los conjuntos de datos actuales de la OIE están limitados tanto en tamaño como en diversidad. Introducimos un nuevo conjunto de datos convirtiendo el conjunto de datos QA-SRL 2.0 en un conjunto de datos de la OIE a gran escala LSOIE. Nuestro conjunto de datos de la LSOIE es 20 veces mayor que el siguiente conjunto de datos más grande de la OIE anotado por humanos. Construimos y evaluamos varios modelos de referencia de la OIE en LSOIE, que proporcionan líneas de base para futuras mejoras en la tarea. Nuestros datos, modelos y código de LSOIE se ponen a disposición del público.', 'ja': 'オープン情報抽出（ ＯＩＥ ）システムは、文の事実上の命題を一連のｎアリータプルに圧縮しようとする。これらのタプルは、ナレッジベースの作成、テキストの巻き込み、自然言語の理解など、自然言語処理の下流タスクに役立ちます。しかし、現在のOIEデータセットは、サイズと多様性の両方で制限されています。QA-SRL 2.0データセットを大規模なOIEデータセットLSOIEに変換し、新しいデータセットを導入します。当社のLSOIEデータセットは、次の最大の人間が注釈を付けたOIEデータセットよりも20倍大きい。私たちは、LSOIE上でいくつかのベンチマークOIEモデルを構築および評価し、タスクの将来の改善のためのベースラインを提供します。当社のLSOIEデータ、モデル、コードは公開されています。', 'hi': 'ओपन इन्फॉर्मेशन एक्सट्रैक्शन (OIE) सिस्टम एक वाक्य के तथ्यात्मक प्रस्तावों को n-ary tuples की एक श्रृंखला में संपीड़ित करना चाहते हैं। ये टुपल्स प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण में डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्यों के लिए उपयोगी हैं जैसे कि ज्ञान आधार निर्माण, पाठ्य अनिवार्यता, और प्राकृतिक भाषा की समझ। हालांकि, वर्तमान OIE डेटासेट आकार और विविधता दोनों में सीमित हैं। हम QA-SRL 2.0 डेटासेट को बड़े पैमाने पर OIE डेटासेट LSOIE में परिवर्तित करके एक नया डेटासेट पेश करते हैं। हमारा LSOIE डेटासेट अगले सबसे बड़े मानव-एनोटेटेड OIE डेटासेट की तुलना में 20 गुना बड़ा है। हम LSOIE पर कई बेंचमार्क OIE मॉडल का निर्माण और मूल्यांकन करते हैं, कार्य पर भविष्य के सुधार के लिए आधार रेखा प्रदान करते हैं। हमारे LSOIE डेटा, मॉडल, और कोड सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध कराए जाते हैं।', 'zh': '开信提取(OIE)系统试图将句子事实命题压缩成一系n元组。 此元组于自然语言之下流(若知识库创建、文本蕴涵、自然语言解)甚有用。 然方今世物卫生组织数集规模、多样性皆限之。 因将 QA-SRL 2.0 数转换为大 OIE 数集 LSOIE 以引入新数集。 臣等 LSOIE 数集比第二大人工注 OIE 数集大 20 倍。 结构LSOEIE评数OIE,为未来改事基线。 吾 LSOIE 数、模、代码明矣。', 'ru': 'Системы извлечения открытой информации (OIE) стремятся сжать фактические предложения предложения в ряд n-арных кортежей. Эти кортежи полезны для последующих задач в обработке естественного языка, таких как создание базы знаний, текстовое влечение и понимание естественного языка. Однако существующие наборы данных МЭБ ограничены как по размеру, так и по разнообразию. Мы вводим новый набор данных путем преобразования набора данных QA-SRL 2.0 в крупномасштабный набор данных OIE LSOIE. Наш набор данных LSOIE в 20 раз больше, чем следующий по величине аннотированный человеком набор данных МЭБ. Мы создаем и оцениваем несколько эталонных моделей OIE на LSOIE, предоставляя исходные данные для будущих улучшений в этой задаче. Наши данные, модели и код LSOIE являются общедоступными.', 'ga': "Féachann córais um Eastóscadh Faisnéise Oscailte (OIE) le tairiscintí fíorasacha pianbhreithe a chomhbhrú isteach i sraith de thuples n-ary. Tá na tuples seo úsáideach le haghaidh tascanna iartheachtacha i bpróiseáil teanga nádúrtha cosúil le cruthú bonn eolais, gabháil téacs, agus tuiscint nádúrtha teanga. Mar sin féin, tá tacair shonraí reatha OIE teoranta ó thaobh méide agus éagsúlachta de. Tugaimid tacar sonraí nua isteach tríd an tacar sonraí QA-SRL 2.0 a thiontú go tacar sonraí OIE ar mhórscála LSOIE. Tá ár dtacar sonraí LSOIE 20 uair níos mó ná an chéad tacar sonraí OIE eile is mó a bhfuil anót daonna air. Déanaimid roinnt samhlacha OIE tagarmharcála a thógáil agus a mheas ar LSOIE, ag soláthar bonnlínte d'fheabhsuithe ar an tasc amach anseo. Cuirtear ár sonraí, samhlacha agus cód LSOIE ar fáil go poiblí.", 'hu': 'Az Open Information Extraction (OIE) rendszerek arra törekszenek, hogy egy mondat tényszerű javaslatait tömörítsék egy sor n-áris tupletbe. Ezek a tuplek hasznosak a természetes nyelv feldolgozásában végzett downstream feladatokhoz, mint például a tudásbázis létrehozása, a szöveges vonatkozás és a természetes nyelv megértése. A jelenlegi OIE-adatkészletek azonban mérete és sokszínűsége egyaránt korlátozott. Új adatkészletet vezetünk be a QA-SRL 2.0 adatkészletet nagyméretű OIE adatkészlettel LSOIE-vá alakítva. LSOIE adatkészletünk 20-szor nagyobb, mint a következő legnagyobb emberi jegyzetekkel ellátott OIE adatkészlet. Az LSOIE-n több referenciaértékű OIE modellt építünk és értékelünk, amelyek alapjait biztosítják a feladat jövőbeni fejlesztéséhez. LSOIE adataink, modelleink és kódjaink nyilvánosan hozzáférhetők.', 'ka': 'Name ეს ტუბლიები გამოსაყენებელია ჩვენი თავისუფალური ენის პროცესი, როგორც ცნობიერების ბაზის შექმნა, ტექსტური შესაძლებლობა და თავისუფალური ენის შესაძლებლო მაგრამ, მიმდინარე OIE მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია და განსხვავებაში უდრის. ჩვენ ახალი მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია QA- SRL 2. 0 მონაცემების კონფიგურაციას დიდი განზომილებული OIE მონაცემების კონფიგურაციას LSOIE. ჩვენი LSOIE მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია 20-ჯერ უფრო დიდია, ვიდრე შემდეგ უფრო დიდი ადამიანური მონაცემები OIE მონაცემები. ჩვენ LSOIE-ზე რამდენიმე ბენქმარკური მოდელეები შექმნა და გავაკეთებთ, რამდენიმე ბენქმარკური გაუკეთესებებისთვის დავიწყებთ. ჩვენი LSOIE-ის მონაცემები, მოდელები და კოდის შესაძლებელია.', 'el': 'Τα συστήματα εξαγωγής ανοικτής πληροφορίας (ΟΕΕ) επιδιώκουν να συμπιέσουν τις πραγματικές προτάσεις μιας πρότασης σε μια σειρά από n-αριώδεις Tuples. Αυτά τα τούβλα είναι χρήσιμα για μεταγενέστερες εργασίες στην επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας όπως η δημιουργία βάσεων γνώσης, η ενσωμάτωση κειμένου και η κατανόηση φυσικής γλώσσας. Ωστόσο, τα τρέχοντα σύνολα δεδομένων του ΟΕΕ είναι περιορισμένα τόσο σε μέγεθος όσο και σε ποικιλομορφία. Εισάγουμε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων μετατρέποντας το σύνολο δεδομένων QA-SRL 2.0 σε ένα μεγάλης κλίμακας σύνολο δεδομένων ΟΕΕ. Το σύνολο δεδομένων μας είναι 20φορές μεγαλύτερο από το επόμενο μεγαλύτερο σύνολο δεδομένων OIE με σχόλια από ανθρώπους. Κατασκευάζουμε και αξιολογούμε διάφορα μοντέλα αναφοράς για το LSOIE, παρέχοντας βάσεις για μελλοντικές βελτιώσεις στο έργο. Τα δεδομένα, τα μοντέλα και ο κώδικας μας διατίθενται στο κοινό.', 'it': "I sistemi Open Information Extraction (OIE) cercano di comprimere le proposizioni fattuali di una frase in una serie di tuples n-ari. Questi tuples sono utili per attività a valle nell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale come la creazione di una base di conoscenza, implicazione testuale e comprensione del linguaggio naturale. Tuttavia, gli attuali set di dati OIE sono limitati sia per dimensioni che per diversità. Introducemo un nuovo set di dati convertendo il set di dati QA-SRL 2.0 in un set di dati OIE su larga scala LSOIE. Il nostro set di dati LSOIE è 20 volte più grande del prossimo set di dati OIE con annotazione umana. Costruiamo e valutiamo diversi modelli OIE di riferimento su LSOIE, fornendo linee di base per miglioramenti futuri sul compito. I nostri dati, modelli e codice LSOIE sono resi pubblici.", 'kk': 'Ашылған мәліметті тарқату (OIE) жүйелері сұлбаны n- ary tuples тізіміне сәйкес келтіру үшін іздейді. Бұл тапульдер табиғи тілдерді өңдеу үшін пайдалы, мәліметтің негізгі құрылуы, мәтіндік жасау және табиғи тілдерді түсіну үшін пайдалы. Бірақ қазіргі OIE деректер жиындары өлшемі мен әртүрлі шектелген. QA- SRL 2. 0 деректер жинағын үлкен масштабтағы OIE деректер жинағына LSOIE аударып жаңа деректер жинағын келтіреміз. Біздің LSOIE деректер жиынымыз келесі адамның ең үлкен OIE деректер жиынынан 20 рет үлкен. Біз LSOIE бағдарламасында бірнеше бағдарламалық OIE үлгілерін құрып, тапсырманың келесі жақсарту үшін негізгі сызықтарын құрып бағалаймыз. Біздің LSOIE деректеріміз, моделдеріміз және кодымыз көпшілікті қол жеткізілген.', 'mk': 'Open Information Extraction (OIE) systems seek to compress the factual propositions of a sentence into a series of n-ary tuples.  Овие двојки се корисни за понатамошните задачи во природното обработување на јазикот како што е создавањето на базата на знаење, текстуално вмешање и природното разбирање на јазикот. Сепак, сегашните податоци на ОИЕ се ограничени во големина и различност. Внесуваме нов компјутер податоци со претворање на компјутерот податоци QA-SRL 2.0 во голем компјутер податоци на OIE LSOIE. Нашиот набор на податоци е 20 пати поголем од следниот најголем набор на податоци на ОИЕ. Конструираме и оценуваме неколку модели на ОИЕ за ЛСОИ, обезбедувајќи основни линии за идни подобрувања на задачата. Нашите LSOIE податоци, модели и код се јавно достапни.', 'ms': 'Sistem Ekstraksi Maklumat Buka (OIE) mencari untuk memaksa cadangan fakta kalimat ke dalam siri n-ary tuples. Dua kali ini berguna untuk tugas turun dalam proses bahasa semulajadi seperti penciptaan pangkalan pengetahuan, penyelesaian teks, dan pemahaman bahasa semulajadi. Namun, set data OIE semasa terhad dalam saiz dan pelbagai. Kami perkenalkan set data baru dengan menukar set data QA-SRL 2.0 ke set data OIE skala besar LSOIE. Set data LSOIE kita 20 kali lebih besar daripada set data OIE terbesar manusia-annotasi berikutnya. Kami membina dan menilai beberapa model OIE benchmark pada LSOIE, menyediakan garis dasar untuk peningkatan masa depan pada tugas. Data LSOIE, model, dan kod kami dibuat tersedia secara umum.', 'lt': 'Atviros informacijos ekstrahavimo (OIE) sistemos siekia sujungti faktinius sakinio pasiūlymus į keletą kartų. These tuples are useful for downstream tasks in natural language processing like knowledge base creation, textual entailment, and natural language understanding.  However, current OIE datasets are limited in both size and diversity.  Įdiegiame naują duomenų rinkinį konvertuodami QA-SRL 2.0 duomenų rinkinį į didelį OIE duomenų rinkinį LSOIE. Mūsų LSOIE duomenų rinkinys yra 20 kartų didesnis už kitą didžiausią žmogaus anotuotą OIE duomenų rinkinį. Sukuriame ir vertiname keletą OIE LSOIE modelių, kuriuose numatomi būsimų užduočių patobulinimų pagrindai. Mūsų LSOIE duomenys, modeliai ir kodas skelbiami viešai.', 'mn': 'Мэдээлэл хадгалах (OIE) системүүд нь өгүүлбэрийн үнэндээ жинхэнэ санаануудыг n-ary tuples руу шилжүүлэхийг хүсч байна. Байгалийн хэл боловсруулалт, мэдлэг суурь боловсруулалт, мөн байгалийн хэл ойлголтын тухай эдгээр туулууд нь тусламжтай. Гэвч одоогийн OIE өгөгдлийн сангууд хэмжээ болон олон төрлийн хэмжээнд хязгаарлагддаг. Бид QA-SRL 2.0 өгөгдлийн санг том хэмжээний OIE өгөгдлийн санд LSOIE руу шинэ өгөгдлийн санг танилцуулдаг. Бидний LSOIE өгөгдлийн санг дараагийн хамгийн том хүний анзаарсан OIE өгөгдлийн санаас 20 дахин их болно. Бид LSOIE дээр олон төрлийн OIE загварыг бүтээж, үнэлэх, ирээдүйн дасгал хөгжлийн суурь шугам өгдөг. Бидний LSOIE өгөгдлийн, загвар, кодыг олон нийтэд ашиглаж чадна.', 'no': 'Opna informasjonsekstraksjonssystem (OIE) søker for å komprimera faktiske forslag av eit setning i ei serie n- arktuplar. Desse tuplane er nyttig for nedstremde oppgåver i naturspråk-handsaming som kunnskapsbaseoppretting, tekstinnstillingar og naturspråk-forståelse. Det gjeldande OIE-datasettet er imidlertid begrenset i både storleik og mangfold. Vi introduserer ein ny dataset ved å konvertera QA-SRL 2.0-dataset til ein stor skala OIE-dataset LSOIE. LSOIE- datasettet vårt er 20 ganger større enn den neste største menneske- notata OIE- datasettet. Vi konstruerer og evaluerer fleire benchmarkmodeller OIE på LSOIE, og tilbyr baselinjer for framtidige forbetringar på oppgåva. LSOIE-data, modeller og koden våre er tilgjengeleg offentlig.', 'ml': 'Open Information Extraction (OIE) systems seek to compress the factual propositions of a sentence into a series of n-ary tuples.  സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയഭാഷയിലെ ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് ഈ ട്യൂപ്പുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തെ സൃഷ്ട എന്നാലും ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ OIE ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d വലിപ്പം വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യാസവും പരിധിയിലാണ്. QA-SRL 2. 0 ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് മാറ്റുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ LSOIE ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് അടുത്ത മികച്ച മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിവരങ്ങളെക്കാള്\u200d 20 തവണ വലുതാണ്. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കുറച്ച് ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഓഐ മോഡലുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുകയും വിലയിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. ജോലിയില്\u200d ഭാവിയുടെ മെച്ച നമ്മുടെ LSOIE ഡേറ്റ, മോഡല്\u200d, കോഡ് പ്രസിദ്ധമായി ലഭ്യമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു.', 'mt': 'Is-sistemi ta’ Estrazzjoni ta’ Informazzjoni Miftuħa (OIE) ifittxu li jikkompressaw il-proposti fattwali ta’ sentenza f’serje ta’ doppji n-ary. Dawn it-doppji huma utli għal kompiti downstream fl-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali bħall-ħolqien tal-bażi tal-għarfien, l-involviment testwali, u l-fehim tal-lingwi naturali. Madankollu, is-settijiet tad-dejta attwali tal-OIE huma limitati kemm fid-daqs kif ukoll fid-diversità. Aħna nintroduċu sett ta’ dejta ġdid billi nikkonvertu sett ta’ dejta QA-SRL 2.0 f’sett ta’ dejta tal-OIE fuq skala kbira LSOIE. Is-sett tad-dejta LSOIE tagħna huwa 20 darba akbar mill-akbar sett tad-dejta tal-OIE annotat mill-bniedem li jmiss. Aħna nibnu u nivvalutaw diversi mudelli ta’ referenza tal-OIE dwar l-LSOIE, li jipprovdu linji bażi għal titjib futur fil-kompitu. Id-dejta, il-mudelli u l-kodiċi LSOIE tagħna huma disponibbli għall-pubbliku.', 'pl': 'Systemy otwartej ekstrakcji informacji (OIE) mają na celu skompresowanie faktycznych propozycji zdania w serię n-arych krotek. Te kropki są przydatne do dalszych zadań w przetwarzaniu języka naturalnego, takich jak tworzenie bazy wiedzy, zaangażowanie tekstowe i zrozumienie języka naturalnego. Jednak obecne zbiory danych OIE są ograniczone zarówno pod względem wielkości, jak i różnorodności. Wprowadzamy nowy zestaw danych poprzez konwersję zestawu danych QA-SRL 2.0 na duży zestaw danych OIE LSOIE. Nasz zbiór danych LSOIE jest 20-krotnie większy niż kolejny największy zbiór danych OIE z adnotacją człowieka. Budujemy i oceniamy kilka modeli referencyjnych OIE na LSOIE, dostarczając podstawy do przyszłych ulepszeń w tym zadaniu. Nasze dane, modele i kod LSOIE są udostępniane publicznie.', 'ro': 'Sistemele de extracție a informațiilor deschise (OIE) caută să comprime propunerile factuale ale unei propoziții într-o serie de tuple n-are. Aceste tuple sunt utile pentru sarcini din aval în procesarea limbajului natural, cum ar fi crearea bazei de cunoștințe, implicarea textuală și înțelegerea limbajului natural. Cu toate acestea, seturile actuale de date OIE sunt limitate atât în dimensiune, cât și în diversitate. Introducem un nou set de date prin conversia setului de date QA-SRL 2.0 într-un set de date OIE la scară largă LSOIE. Setul nostru de date LSOIE este de 20 de ori mai mare decât următorul set de date OIE cu adnotare umană. Construim și evaluăm mai multe modele OIE de referință pe LSOIE, oferind linii de referință pentru îmbunătățirile viitoare ale sarcinii. Datele, modelele și codul LSOIE sunt puse la dispoziția publicului.', 'sr': 'Sistemi otvorene izvlačenja informacija (OIE) traže da kompresiraju činjenične prijedloge rečenice u seriju n-ary tuples. Ove tuple su korisne za spuštanje zadataka prirodnog jezika poput stvaranja baze znanja, tekstualne želje i prirodnog razumevanja jezika. Međutim, trenutne OIE podatke su ograničene veličinom i raznolikošću. Predstavljamo novi set podataka konvertirajući QA-SRL 2.0 setu podataka na veliku skalu OIE setu podataka LSOIE. Naša LSOIE podataka je 20 puta veća od sledećeg najvećeg kompleta podataka OIE-a. Konstruciramo i procjenjujemo nekoliko modela OIE-a na LSOIE-u, pružajući osnovne linije za buduće poboljšanje zadatka. Naši LSOIE podaci, modeli i kodovi su javno dostupni.', 'so': 'Isticmaalka la soo saarista macluumaadka furan (OIE) waxay rabaan inay hoos u dhigtaan soo bandhigyada rasmiga ah ee lagu soo rido qoraal ka mid ah kaneecada n-ary. Adeegyadaasu waxey faa’iido u leedahay hawlaha hoose ee afka dabiicadda ah, sida abuuridda aasaasiga aqoonta, garashada qoraalka iyo waxgarashada afka dabiicadda ah. However, current OIE datasets are limited in both size and diversity.  QA-SRL 2.0 ayaannu soo bandhignaynaa sawir cusub oo lagu beddelayo QA-SRL 2.0 LSOIE macluumaadkayagu waa 20 jeer ka weyn taariikhda qofka ugu dambeeya ee qofka ugu weyn ee OIE. Waxaannu dhisnay oo qiimeynaynaa tusaalooyin badan oo ku qoran LSOIE, waxaana sameynaynaa aasaasyo u ah horumarinta mustaqbalka shaqada. Macluumaadyadayada LSOIE, tusaalayaasha iyo codyadayada waxaa lagu soo bandhigaa bayaan.', 'ta': '@ info இந்த குறிப்புகள் அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படையை உருவாக்குதல், நிரல் அறியாத மொழி புரிந்து கொள்ள இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாடுகளில However, current OIE datasets are limited in both size and diversity.  QA- SRL 2. 0 தகவல் அமைப்பை பெரிய OIE தகவல் அமைப்பு LSOIE ஆக மாற்றி ஒரு புதிய தகவல் அமைப்பை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். எங்கள் LSOIE தகவல் அமைப்பு அடுத்த பெரிய மனித குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட OIE தகவல் அமைப்பை விட 20 மடங்கு பெரியது. LSOIE மாதிரிகளை நாம் உருவாக்கி மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் LSOIE மாதிரிகளை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம், பணியில் எதிர்கால முன்ன எங்கள் LSOIE தகவல், மாதிரிகள், மற்றும் குறியீடு பொதுவாக கிடைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது.', 'si': '@ title: window මේ ටුප්ල්ස් වල ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විදියට නමුත්, ප්\u200dරස්තූත OIE දත්ත සෙට් ප්\u200dරමාණය හා විවිධානය දෙන්නම් සීමාවයි. අපි අළුත් දත්ත සෙට් එකක් ප්\u200dරදානය කරනවා QA- SRL 2. 0 දත්ත සෙට්ටුව ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණයක් OIE දත්ත සෙට්ට LSOIE වලට. අපේ LSOIE දත්ත සැට 20 පාරක් වැඩියි ඊළඟ ලොකු මිනිස්සුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරතිශාලිත OIE දත්ත සැට වඩා. අපි LSOIE එකේ බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් OIE මොඩේල් වලින් සිද්ධා කරනවා, අනාගතයේ වැඩේ අනාගතයේ වැඩ කරන්න අධාර්යය ප්\u200dරවේ අපේ LSOIE දත්ත, මොඩේල්, සහ කෝඩ් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ලැබෙනවා.', 'ur': 'Open Information Extraction (OIE) systems seek to compress the factual propositions of a sentence into a series of n-ary tuples. یہ ٹوپل نیچے کاموں کے لئے مفید ہیں طبیعی زبان کی پردازش میں، جیسے علم بنیاد پیدا کرنے، ٹیکسٹی تولید اور طبیعی زبان سمجھنے کے لئے۔ However, current OIE data sets are limited in both size and diversity. ہم ایک نوی ڈاٹ سٹ کو پہنچاتے ہیں QA-SRL 2.0 ڈاٹ سٹ کو ایک بڑی اسکیل OIE ڈاٹ سٹ LSOIE میں تبدیل کر۔ ہمارے LSOIE ڈاٹ سٹ آگے بڑے انسان کے اندر سے 20 برابر بڑا ہے. ہم نے LSOIE پر چند بینچم مارک OIE موڈل بنایا اور ارزش کیا، اس کام پر آیندہ تغییرات کے لئے بنسٹلینوں کے لئے۔ ہمارے LSOIE ڈیٹا، نمڈل اور کوڈ ظاہر طور پر موجود ہیں.', 'sv': 'Open Information Extraction (OIE) system syftar till att komprimera de faktiska förslagen i en mening till en serie av n-ary tupler. Dessa tupler är användbara för nedströms uppgifter i naturlig språkbehandling som kunskapsbas skapande, textinvolvering och naturlig språkförståelse. De nuvarande OIE-datauppsättningarna är dock begränsade i både storlek och mångfald. Vi introducerar ett nytt dataset genom att konvertera QA-SRL 2.0 dataset till en storskalig OIE-dataset LSOIE. Vår LSOIE-datauppsättning är 20 gånger större än den näst största mänskliga-kommenterade OIE-datauppsättningen. Vi konstruerar och utvärderar flera riktmärken för OIE-modeller på LSOIE, vilket ger underlag för framtida förbättringar av uppgiften. Våra LSOIE-data, modeller och kod görs tillgängliga för allmänheten.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Bu soʻzlar taʼminot asosiy yaratish, texnologiya ilmiyot va tabiiy tilni o'rganish kabi soddalik tilning vazifalari uchun foydalanadi. Lekin, joriy OIE maʼlumot moslamalari oʻlchami va turli oʻlchamda chegara. Biz QA-SRL 2.0 maʼlumotlar satrini katta OIE maʼlumotlar tarkibini LSOIE'ga aylantirish uchun yangi maʼlumot set'ini koʻrsatimiz. LSOIE maʼlumotlar tarkibi keyingi eng katta inson uchun 20 marta katta. Biz LSOIE bilan bir necha benchmark modellarini yaratishmiz va qiymatimiz, bu vazifaning kelajakdagi yaxshi o'zgarishlar uchun asosiy sonlarini yaratadi. LSOIE haqida maʼlumot, modellar va kodlar faqat mavjud.", 'vi': 'Hệ thống Open Information extremetion (I.E) tìm kiếm để đè n én các trạng thái thực tế của một bản thành một chuỗi n-ri. Những nút áo này có ích cho việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên như kiến thức, kết cấu kết cấu và hiểu biết ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Tuy nhiên, các tập tin hiện thời của Oliver có giới hạn về kích thước và đa dạng. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một tập tin mới bằng cách chuyển đổi dữ liệu QA-R 2.0 thành một tập tin của Oliver trên diện rộng. Hệ thống dữ liệu LSD của chúng ta lớn hơn 20 lần lớn hơn so với tập tin Oliver lớn hơn kế tiếp. Chúng tôi xây dựng và đánh giá vài mô- đun chuẩn của giàn dầu (ISO), cung cấp các đường hầm để cải tiến nhiệm vụ tương lai. Dữ liệu, mẫu và mật mã của chúng tôi đều được công khai.', 'hr': 'Sistemi otvorene izvlačenja informacija (OIE) traže da kompresiraju činjenične prijedloge kazne u nizu n-ary tuples. Ove tuple su korisne za spuštanje zadataka prirodnog jezika poput stvaranja baze znanja, tekstualne želje i prirodnog razumijevanja jezika. Međutim, trenutne OIE podatke ograničene su u veličini i raznolikosti. Predstavljamo novi set podataka konvertirajući QA-SRL 2.0 set podataka na veliku skalu OIE set podataka LSOIE. Naša LSOIE podataka je 20 puta veća od sljedećeg najvećeg broja podataka s ljudskim annotiranjem OIE-a. Konstruiramo i procjenjujemo nekoliko standardnih modela OIE na LSOIE-u, pružajući osnovne linije za buduće poboljšanje zadatka. Naši LSOIE podaci, modeli i kodovi su javno dostupni.', 'nl': 'Open Information Extraction (OIE) systemen proberen de feitelijke stellingen van een zin te comprimeren tot een reeks van n-aire tupels. Deze tupels zijn nuttig voor downstreamtaken in de verwerking van natuurlijke taal, zoals het creëren van een kennisbasis, tekstuele implicatie en natuurlijk taalbegrip. De huidige OIE datasets zijn echter beperkt in grootte en diversiteit. We introduceren een nieuwe dataset door de QA-SRL 2.0 dataset om te zetten naar een grootschalige OIE dataset LSOIE. Onze LSOIE dataset is 20-maal groter dan de op één na grootste door mensen geannoteerde OIE dataset. We bouwen en evalueren verschillende benchmark OIE modellen op LSOIE, die baselines bieden voor toekomstige verbeteringen van de taak. Onze LSOIE-gegevens, modellen en code worden openbaar gemaakt.', 'da': 'Open Information Extraction (OIE) systemer søger at komprimere de faktiske forslag i en sætning til en række n-ary tupler. Disse tupler er nyttige til downstream opgaver i naturlig sprogbehandling som vidensbase oprettelse, tekst involvering og naturlig sprogforståelse. De nuværende OIE-datasæt er imidlertid begrænsede i både størrelse og mangfoldighed. Vi introducerer et nyt datasæt ved at konvertere QA-SRL 2.0 datasættet til et stort OIE datasæt LSOIE. Vores LSOIE datasæt er 20 gange større end det næststørste menneskestørrede OIE datasæt. Vi konstruerer og evaluerer flere benchmark OIE modeller på LSOIE, der giver baselines for fremtidige forbedringer af opgaven. Vores LSOIE data, modeller og kode gøres offentligt tilgængelige.', 'bg': 'Системите за извличане на отворена информация (OIE) се стремят да компресират фактическите твърдения на дадено изречение в поредица от n-арни тупли. Тези тупли са полезни за задачи надолу по веригата в обработката на естествения език като създаване на база знания, текстово обвързване и разбиране на естествения език. Настоящите набори от данни на OIE обаче са ограничени както по размер, така и по разнообразие. Въвеждаме нов набор от данни чрез конвертиране на набор от данни QA-SRL 2.0 в мащабен набор от данни на OIE LSOIE. Нашият набор от данни на ОИЕ е 20 пъти по-голям от следващия най-голям набор от данни на ОИЕ с анотация на хора. Ние конструираме и оценяваме няколко референтни модела на ОИЕ за ОИЕ, осигурявайки базови линии за бъдещи подобрения на задачата. Нашите данни, модели и код са публично достъпни.', 'de': 'Open Information Extraction (OIE)-Systeme versuchen, die sachlichen Sätze eines Satzes in eine Reihe von n-ären Tupeln zu komprimieren. Diese Tupel sind nützlich für nachgelagerte Aufgaben in der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache wie die Erstellung von Wissensgrundlagen, textuelle Einbeziehung und natürliches Sprachverständnis. Allerdings sind die aktuellen OIE-Datensätze sowohl in ihrer Größe als auch in ihrer Vielfalt begrenzt. Wir führen einen neuen Datensatz ein, indem wir den QA-SRL 2.0 Datensatz in einen großen OIE Datensatz LSOIE umwandeln. Unser LSOIE-Datensatz ist 20-mal größer als der nächstgrößte vom Menschen annotierte OIE-Datensatz. Wir konstruieren und evaluieren mehrere Benchmark-OIE-Modelle auf LSOIE, die Grundlagen für zukünftige Verbesserungen der Aufgabe liefern. Unsere LSOIE-Daten, Modelle und Code werden öffentlich zugänglich gemacht.', 'fa': 'سیستم اخراج اطلاعات باز (OIE) تلاش می\u200cکنند که پیشنهاد حقیقی یک جمله را در یک مجموعه از توپ\u200cهای n-ary فشار دهند. این توپ\u200cها برای کارهای پایین\u200cپایین در پرداخت زبان طبیعی مثل آفرینش پایین دانش، استعداد متن و درک زبان طبیعی مفید هستند. با این حال، مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای OIE فعلی در اندازه و مختلف محدود است. ما مجموعه داده\u200cهای جدید را با تبدیل کردن مجموعه داده\u200cهای QA-SRL 2.0 به مجموعه داده\u200cهای بزرگ OIE LSOIE معرفی می\u200cکنیم. مجموعه داده های LSOIE ما ۲۰ برابر بزرگترین مجموعه داده های OIE را به انسان نشان داده است. ما چند مدل مرکز OIE روی LSOIE را ساختیم و ارزیابی می کنیم، که خطوط بنیادی برای بهترین آینده در این کار را می دهیم. اطلاعات LSOIE، مدل و کد ما به طور عمومی در دسترس هستند.', 'id': 'Sistem Ekstraksi Informasi Buka (OIE) berusaha mengkompresi proposisi faktual dari kalimat ke dalam seri n-ary tuples. Dua kali ini berguna untuk tugas turun dalam proses bahasa alam seperti penciptaan dasar pengetahuan, keterlibatan teks, dan pemahaman bahasa alam. Namun, set data OIE saat ini terbatas dalam ukuran dan diversitas. Kami memperkenalkan set data baru dengan mengubah set data QA-SRL 2.0 ke set data OIE skala besar LSOIE. Set data LSOIE kita 20 kali lebih besar dari set data OIE terbesar berikutnya. Kami membangun dan mengevaluasi beberapa benchmark OIE model pada LSOIE, menyediakan garis dasar untuk perkembangan masa depan dalam tugas. Data LSOIE, model, dan kode kami dibuat publik tersedia.', 'ko': '오픈 정보 추출 (OIE) 시스템은 문장의 사실 명제를 일련의 n원 그룹으로 압축하려고 한다.이러한 원조는 자연 언어 처리 중의 하류 임무에 매우 유용하다. 예를 들어 지식 라이브러리 창설, 텍스트 함축과 자연 언어 이해 등이다.그러나 현재 국제수역국의 데이터 집합은 규모와 다양성에 한계가 있다.QA-SRL 2.0 데이터 세트를 대규모 OIE 데이터 세트 LSOIE로 변환함으로써 새로운 데이터 세트를 도입했습니다.우리의 LSOIE 데이터 세트는 제2의 인류 주석 OIE 데이터 세트의 20배이다.우리는 LSOIE에서 몇 가지 기준 OIE 모델을 구축하고 평가하여 미래 임무의 개선에 기반을 제공했다.우리의 LSOIE 데이터, 모델 및 코드는 공개적입니다.', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa Utoleaji wa Habari (OIE) unatafuta kuingiza mapendekezo ya ukweli ya hukumu katika mfululizo wa vifaa vya msingi. Vifaa hivi vina manufaa kwa kazi za mito ya chini katika upasuaji wa lugha asili kama vile uumbaji wa msingi wa maarifa, maarifa ya msingi, na uelewa wa lugha ya asili. Hata hivyo, seti za taarifa za sasa za OIE zinazuiwa kwa ukubwa na tofauti. Tunaonyesha seti mpya ya taarifa kwa kubadilisha seti ya data ya QA-SRL 2.0 kwa kiwango kikubwa cha OIE LSOIE. Mpango wetu wa taarifa za LSOIE ni mara 20 zaidi ya seti kubwa zaidi ya taarifa za OIE za binadamu. Tunajenga na kutathmini mifano kadhaa ya bendera ya OIE kwenye LSOIE, na kutoa misingi kwa ajili ya maendeleo ya baadaye katika kazi hiyo. Takwimu zetu za LSOIE, mifano na sheria zinapatikana hadharani.', 'tr': "Aç Maglumat Açmak (OIE) sistemleri bir sözleniň faktal tekliplerini n-arýr tupllerniň bir serisine sykmak üçin gözleýär. Bu tuplar tebigy dil işlemekde täsirli zadlar üçin ullanýar, bilim üýtgetmesi, metin sözlemesi we tebigy dil düşünmesi ýaly. Yöne häzirki OIE veri setirleri hem ululyk hem çeşitlikde çizildi. QA-SRL 2.0 sany golaý ölçekli OIE maglumaty LSOIE'e üýtgeden täze bir tertibleme bilen girdirdik Biziň LSOIE maglumatlarymyz indiki beýik adamlaryň tanyş edilen OIE maglumatlaryndan 20 gezek ulydyr LSOIE'de birnäçe benchmark nusgalary bar we çykarýarys, işiň gelejekde gelişmeler üçin esaslarny saýlaýrys. Biziň LSOIE maglumatymyz, nusgalarymyz we kodymyz publika meýilleşdirilýär.", 'af': "Open Informasie Uitpakking (OIE) stelsels soek n a komprimeer die faktiese voorstellings van 'n seting binne 'n reeks n- ary tuples. Hierdie tuples is nuttig vir onderstreem opdragte in natuurlike taal verwerking soos kennis basiese skepping, tekstuurlike inhouding en natuurlike taal verstanding. Maar, huidige OIE datastelle is beperk in grootte en verskeidigheid. Ons introduseer 'n nuwe datastel deur die QA- SRL 2. 0 datastel te omskakel na 'n groot- skaal OIE datastel LSOIE. Ons LSOIE datastel is 20 maal groter as die volgende grootste menslike- notateerde OIE datastel. Ons konstrukteer en evalueer veelvuldige benchmark OIE modele op LSOIE, verskaf basis lyne vir toekomstige verbeteringe op die taak. Ons LSOIE data, modele en kode is openlik beskikbaar.", 'sq': 'Sistemet e nxjerrjes së informacionit të hapur (OIE) kërkojnë të kompresojnë propozimet faktike të një fjalie n ë një seri n-ary tuples. Këto duartrokitje janë të dobishme për detyrat më poshtë në procesimin natyror të gjuhës si krijimi i bazës së njohurive, përfshirje tekstuale dhe kuptimi natyror i gjuhës. Megjithatë, të dhënat e tanishme të OIE janë të kufizuara si në madhësi ashtu edhe në diversitet. Ne prezantojmë një set të ri të dhënash duke konvertuar QA-SRL 2.0 të dhënash në një set të dhënash të madhe OIE LSOIE. Grupi ynë i të dhënave LSOIE është 20 herë më i madh se grupi tjetër më i madh i të dhënave të anotuara nga njerëzit. Ne ndërtojmë dhe vlerësojmë disa modele OIE në LSOIE, duke ofruar linja bazë për përmirësimet e ardhshme në detyrë. Të dhënat tona LSOIE, modelet dhe kodet janë bërë të disponueshme publikisht.', 'am': 'ክፈት እነዚህ አካባቢዎች የውይይት ቋንቋ መፍጠር፣ የጽሑፍ ማወቅ እና የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማስተዋል እና የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማስተዋል የሚጠቅሙ ናቸው፡፡ ነገር ግን የአሁኑ የOIE ዳታ ማተሚያዎች መጠን እና ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ነው፡፡ የQA-SRL 2.0 ዳታ-setet ወደ ትልቅ OIE ዳታ-setን LSOIE በመለወጥ አዲስ ዳታ setet እናስታውቃለን፡፡ LSOIE ዳታ-setet ከሁለተኛው ትልቁ ሰው OIE ዳታተር ይልቅ 20 እጥፍ ትልቅ ነው፡፡ We construct and evaluate several benchmark OIE models on LSOIE, providing baselines for future improvements on the task.  የLSOIE ዳታዎች፣ ሞዴላዎች እና ኮድ በሙሉ የተገኘ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Բաց տեղեկատվության արտահանման համակարգերը փորձում են ընդգծել նախադասության փաստացի առաջարկները n-ar-երկու շարքերի: Այս երկու անգամ օգտակար են բնական լեզվի վերաբերյալ բնական գործողությունների համար, ինչպիսիք են գիտելիքի հիմքի ստեղծումը, տեքստային ներգրավումը և բնական լեզվի հասկացությունը: Այնուամենայնիվ, ներկայիս ԱՄՆ-ի տվյալների համակարգերը սահմանափակված են չափերի և բազմազանության մեջ: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր տվյալների համակարգ QA-SSL 2.0 տվյալների համակարգը մեծ մասշտաբ համակարգ LSOCE-ի: Մեր LSOCE-ի տվյալների համակարգը 20 անգամ ավելի մեծ է, քան հաջորդ ամենամեծ մարդկային նկարագրված համակարգը: We construct and evaluate several benchmark OIE models on LSOIE, providing baselines for future improvements on the task.  Մեր LSOCE-ի տվյալները, մոդելները և կոդը հասանելի են:', 'az': "Açıq Malümat Çıqış Sistemləri fərqli bir cümlənin əsas təsirlərini n-ary tuples seriyasın a sıkıştırmaq istəyirlər. Bu tuplar təbiətli dil işləməsi kimi təbiətli işlər üçün faydalıdır. Bilim bazı yaradılış, tekst tutma və təbiətli dil anlama kimi. Ancaq həmin OIE veri qurğuları həm böyüklükdə də, həm də müxtəlif ölçülərdə sınırlandır. QA-SRL 2.0 veri quruluğunu böyük ölçüdə OIE veri quruluğu LSOIE ilə dəyişdiririk. Bizim LSOIE veri quruluğumuz sonraki ən böyük insan məlumatı quruluğundan 20 kat daha böyükdür. Biz LSOIE'nin bir neçə benchmark OIE modellərini inşa edir və değerlendiririk, bu işdə gələcək düzəltmələr üçün baz çətinlər təmin edirik. Bizim LSOIE məlumatlarımız, modellərimiz və kodlarımız açıq-aşkar faydalanır.", 'bn': 'তথ্য এক্সট্র্যাক্ট্র্যাক্ট্র্যাকশন (OIE) সিস্টেম অনুসন্ধান করে একটি বাক্যের বাস্তবতার প্রস্তাবের প্রস্তাব ব্যবহা প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ায় এই টুপিলগুলো প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার কাজের জন্য উপকার রয়েছে, যেমন জ্ঞানের বেস স সৃষ্টি, টেক্স তবে বর্তমান OIE তথ্য সীমাবদ্ধ এবং বৈচিত্র্যের মধ্যে। কিউ-এসআরএল ২. ০ ডাটাসেটকে বিশাল পরিমাণ OIE ডাটাসেট LSOIEে পরিবর্তন করার মাধ্যমে আমরা একটি নতুন ডাটাসেট পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই। আমাদের LSOIE ডাটাসেট পরবর্তী সর্বোচ্চ মানুষের তথ্যের চেয়ে ২০ বার বড়। আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি বেঞ্চাম্পার্ক অআই মডেল নির্মাণ করি এবং মূল্যায়ন করি এলএসওআইE-এ, যা কাজের ভবিষ্যত উন্নয়নের জন্য বেসেলাইন দ আমাদের LSOIE তথ্য, মডেল এবং কোড প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যাচ্ছে।', 'cs': 'Systémy otevřené extrakce informací (OIE) usilují o kompresi faktických návrhů věty do řady n-árních tulů. Tyto tuples jsou užitečné pro následné úkoly ve zpracování přirozeného jazyka, jako je tvorba znalostní báze, textové implikace a porozumění přirozenému jazyku. Současné datové sady OIE jsou však omezeny jak velikostí, tak rozmanitostí. Představujeme novou datovou sadu převodem QA-SRL 2.0 datové sady na rozsáhlou sadu OIE LSOIE. Naše LSOIE datová sada je 20krát větší než další největší člověkem anotovaná OIE datová sada. Konstruujeme a vyhodnocujeme několik referenčních modelů OIE na LSOIE, které poskytují základní linie pro budoucí zlepšení úkolu. Naše LSOIE data, modely a kód jsou zpřístupněny veřejně.', 'et': 'Avatud teabe ekstraheerimise (OIE) süsteemide eesmärk on kokku suruda lause faktilised väited reaks n-aarseteks tupliteks. Need tuplid on kasulikud looduskeele töötlemise järgnevate ülesannete jaoks, nagu teadmistebaasi loomine, tekstiline kaasamine ja looduskeele mõistmine. Siiski on OIE praegused andmekogumid nii suuruse kui ka mitmekesisuse poolest piiratud. Tutvustame uut andmekogumit, teisendades QA-SRL 2.0 andmekogumi suuremahuliseks OIE andmekogumiks LSOIE. Meie LSOIE andmekogum on 20 korda suurem kui järgmine suurim inimmärgistusega OIE andmekogum. Konstrueerime ja hindame LSOIE-le mitmeid võrdlusmudeleid, mis annavad aluse ülesande edasiseks täiustamiseks. Meie LSOIE andmed, mudelid ja kood on avalikult kättesaadavad.', 'bs': 'Sistemi otvorene izvlačenja informacija (OIE) traže da kompresiraju činjenične prijedloge rečenice u seriju n-ary tuples. Ove tuple su korisne za spuštanje zadataka prirodnog jezika, poput stvaranja baze znanja, tekstualne želje i prirodnog razumijevanja jezika. Međutim, trenutne OIE podatke ograničene su u veličini i raznolikosti. Predstavljamo novi set podataka konvertirajući QA-SRL 2.0 set podataka na veliku skalu OIE set podataka LSOIE. Naša LSOIE podataka je 20 puta veća od sljedećeg najvećeg kompleta podataka s ljudskim annotiranjem OIE-a. Konstruciramo i procjenjujemo nekoliko modela OIE-a na LSOIE-u, pružajući osnovne linije za buduće poboljšanje zadatka. Naši LSOIE podaci, modeli i kodovi su publicno dostupni.', 'ca': "Els sistemes d'extracció oberta d'informació (OIE) busquen comprimir les proposicions de fet d'una frase en una sèrie de dubles n-ari. Aquests dobles són útils per a tasques avançades en el processament natural de llenguatges com la creació de la base de coneixements, l'involucració textual i la comprensió natural del llenguatge. Tot i així, els conjunts de dades actuals de l'OIE són limitats tant en mida com en diversitat. Introduïm un nou conjunt de dades convertint el conjunt de dades QA-SRL 2.0 en un conjunt de dades de gran escala de l'OIE LSOIE. El nostre conjunt de dades LSOIE és 20 vegades més gran que el següent conjunt de dades de l'OIE anotats per humans. Construim i evaluem varis models de referència de l'OIE en LSOIE, proporcionant línies de base per millorar la tasca futura. Our LSOIE data, models, and code are made publicly available.", 'fi': 'Open Information Extraction (OIE) -järjestelmät pyrkivät tiivistämään lauseen tosiasialliset väitteet sarjaan n-ary tuples. Nämä tuplat ovat hyödyllisiä luonnollisen kielen käsittelyn loppupään tehtävissä, kuten tietopohjan luomisessa, tekstien liittämisessä ja luonnollisen kielen ymmärtämisessä. OIE:n nykyiset tietoaineistot ovat kuitenkin kooltaan ja moninaisuudeltaan rajallisia. Esittelemme uuden aineiston muuntamalla QA-SRL 2.0 -aineiston laajamittaiseksi OIE-aineistoksi LSOIE. LSOIE-aineistomme on 20 kertaa suurempi kuin seuraavaksi suurin ihmisillä merkitty OIE-aineisto. Rakennamme ja arvioimme useita vertailumalleja LSOIE:sta, tarjoten perustan tehtävän tuleville parannuksille. LSOIE-tietomme, mallit ja koodimme ovat julkisesti saatavilla.', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Piring Nanging, OINT dataset dadi iki bakal dumadhi kanggo ukuran seneng kalagayet string" in "context_BAR_stringLink text We rebuke and assess Opo data, model lan kode nambah kang didasar', 'sk': 'Sistemi za odprto pridobivanje informacij (OIE) skušajo združiti dejanske predloge stavka v niz n-arnih tuplov. Ti dvojniki so uporabni za nadaljnje naloge pri obdelavi naravnega jezika, kot so ustvarjanje baze znanja, besedilno vključevanje in razumevanje naravnega jezika. Vendar pa so sedanji nabori podatkov OIE omejeni tako po velikosti kot raznolikosti. Novi nabor podatkov uvajamo s pretvorbo nabora podatkov QA-SRL 2.0 v obsežen nabor podatkov OIE LSOIE. Naš nabor podatkov LSOIE je 20-krat večji od naslednjega največjega nabora podatkov OIE z oznakami človeka. Izdelujemo in ocenjujemo več primerjalnih modelov OIE na LSOIE, ki zagotavljajo osnovne točke za prihodnje izboljšave naloge. Naši podatki, modeli in koda LSOIE so javno dostopni.', 'ha': "Open Information Extraction (OIE) systems seek to compress the factual propositions of a sentence into a series of n-ary tuples.  Wannan tufãfi yana da amfani da wa aikin durowa da ke cikin jarraba lugha masu natsuwa kamar halittar maɓallin ilmi, da masu da sani na littafi da misalin harshe na asali. Babu kuma, tsarin maɓallin OIU da ake kai yanzu ana ƙayyade cikin girma da baƙaƙƙe. Tuna gane wani tsari na danne da za'a sami QA-SRL 2.0 zuwa tsarin da aka girma OIU database LSOIU. QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu Tuna samar da shi, kuma Mu ƙaddara misãlai masu ƙaranci na OIU a kan LSOIEyi, kuma Muke samar da bakwai wa gyãra masu gabanin aikin. QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu", 'he': 'מערכות מחלץ מידע פתוחה (OIE) מחפשות ללחוץ את הצעות העובדות של משפט לסדרה של n-ary tuples. הכפולים האלה שימושיים למשימות מתחתיות בעבודת שפת טבעית כמו יצירת בסיס הידע, התערבות טקסטלית, ובנה שפת טבעית. עם זאת, קבוצות נתונים הנוכחיות של OIE מוגבלות בגודל וגוון. אנחנו מציגים קבוצת נתונים חדשה על ידי שינוי קבוצת נתונים QA-SRL 2.0 למערכת נתונים גדולה של OIE LSOIE. קבוצת הנתונים שלנו של LSOIE גדולה 20 פעמים יותר מהקבוצת הנתונים הגדולה ביותר הבאה של OIE. אנחנו בונים וערכים כמה דוגמנים של OIE על LSOIE, מספקים קווים בסיסיים לשיפורים עתידים על המשימה. נתוני LSOIE שלנו, דוגמנים, וקוד הופכים לפומבי.', 'bo': 'ཆ་འཕྲིན་དབྱིབས་བཤེར་བྱེད་ནུས་མ་ལག་གིས་ཚིག་གི་སྐད་རིགས་n-ary tuples་གི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་ཡུན་གྱི་བསམ་འཆར་བྱེད་དགོས། ར tuple འདི་དག་ནི་རང་བཞིན་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་བའི་བྱ་འགུལ་ལ་ཕན་ཐོགས་ཅན་ཅིག་ཡིན། ཡིན་ནའང་། ད་ལྟོའི་OIE གནད་སྡུད་ཆེ་ཆུང་དང་སྣེ་ཚོགས་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་ཉར་ཚགས་ཡོད་པ ང་ཚོས་QA-SRL 2.0་གནད་སྡུད་ནང་དུ་ཚད་ཆེ་བའི་OIE གནད་སྡུད་གཞི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་གསར་བ་སྤྲོད་དགོས་པ ང་ཚོའི་LSOIE གནད་སྡུད་གཞུང་སྒྲིག We construct and evaluate several benchmark OIE models on LSOIE, providing baselines for the future improvements on the task. ང་ཚོའི་LSOIE གཟུགས་རིས་དང་། མིག་ཆས་དང་ཨང་རིས་མང་ཙམ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Unsupervised Abstractive Summarization of Bengali Text Documents', 'fr': 'Synthèse abstraite non supervisée de documents texte en bengali', 'pt': 'Resumo Abstrativo Não Supervisionado de Documentos de Texto Bengali', 'es': 'Resumen abstracto no supervisado de documentos de texto bengalí', 'ar': 'تلخيص تجريدي غير خاضع للإشراف لوثائق النص البنغالي', 'hi': 'बंगाली पाठ दस्तावेज़ों का असुरक्षित अमूर्त सारांशीकरण', 'ru': 'Неконтролируемое абстрактное резюме текстов на бенгальском языке', 'ja': 'ベンガル語テキスト文書の監督なし抽象的な要約', 'zh': '孟加拉语文本文档无监督抽象摘要', 'ga': 'Achoimre Teibí Neamh-mhaoirsithe ar Dhoiciméid Téacs Beangáilis', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Felügyelet nélküli absztraktív összefoglaló Bengáli szövegdokumentumok', 'el': 'Μη εποπτευόμενη αφηρημένη περίληψη εγγράφων κειμένου της Βεγγάλης', 'lt': 'Neprižiūrima Bengalų tekstinių dokumentų santrauka', 'mk': 'Ненадгледувана апстрактивна резимулација на бенгалиски текстови документи', 'it': 'Sintesi astratta non controllata dei documenti di testo bengalesi', 'kk': 'Бенгалия мәтін құжаттарының абстрактивті тұжырымдамасы', 'ml': 'ബെങ്കാലിയുടെ പദാവലി രേഖകളുടെ അബ്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്ടിവിന്റെ ചുരുക്കം', 'mn': 'Бенгалийн Текст баримтуудын хэмжээсгүүдийн хэмжээсгүүд', 'mt': 'Sommarju Abstrattiv Mhux Sorveljat tad-Dokumenti tat-Test Bengali', 'ro': 'Rezumată abstractă nesupravegheată a documentelor text bengaleze', 'ms': 'Comment', 'si': 'Name', 'no': 'Uansvart abstraktiv samandrag av Bengaliske tekstdokument', 'pl': 'Abstrakcyjne podsumowanie dokumentów tekstowych w języku bengalskim', 'sv': 'Abstraktiv sammanfattning av bengaliska textdokument utan övervakning', 'so': 'Summary summarization of text documents in Bengali', 'ta': 'பெங்காலி உரை ஆவணங்களின் சுருக்கம்', 'sr': 'Nepotrebna abstraktivna sažetka Bengalijskih tekstskih dokumenta', 'ur': 'بنگلی ٹیکسٹ ڈکومکینٹوں کی غیرقابل تحقیق', 'vi': 'Chưa được kiểm tra Chưa xác định', 'uz': 'Name', 'da': 'Abstraktiv opsummering af bengaliske tekstdokumenter uden tilsyn', 'nl': 'Abstracte samenvatting van Bengaalse tekstdocumenten zonder toezicht', 'bg': 'Абстрактно обобщение на текстови документи на бенгалски език', 'hr': 'Nepotrebna abstraktivna sažetka Bengalskih tekstskih dokumenta', 'de': 'Unbeaufsichtigte Zusammenfassung von bengalischen Textdokumenten', 'id': 'Penapisan Abstraktif Dokumen Teks Bengali yang tidak diawasi', 'ko': '방글라데시 어문 본 문서의 무감독 요약', 'fa': 'جمع\u200cآوری غیرقابل تحقیق سند متن بنگالی', 'sw': 'Ujumbe wa nyaraka za maandishi nchini Bengali usiotangaliwa', 'tr': 'Bengali Metin Senedleriniň Gaýd Edilmesi', 'af': 'Onondersteunde Abstractive Opsomming van Bengali Teks Dokumente', 'sq': 'Përshkrimi abstraktiv i dokumenteve teksti bengaleze pa mbikqyrje', 'bn': 'বাংলার টেক্সট ডকুমেন্টের সামারিজেশন', 'hy': 'Բենգալացի տեքստի փաստաթղթերի առանց վերահսկման վերացման', 'am': 'የባንጋሊ ጽሑፍ ሰነዶች ማጠቃለያ', 'ca': 'Resumen abstractiu sense supervisió dels documents bengalès', 'az': 'Bengali Metin Sökmlərinin Avstraktiv Qısqa', 'cs': 'Abstraktní shrnutí bengálských textových dokumentů bez dohledu', 'bs': 'Nepotrebna abstraktivna sažetka Bengalijskih tekstskih dokumenta', 'fi': 'Tarkkailematon tiivistelmä bengalin tekstiasiakirjoista', 'et': 'Bengali tekstidokumentide järelevalveta kokkuvõte', 'he': 'מסמכים טקסטים בנגאליים', 'jv': 'Samsul BenGali Teks Dokumen Gak Cocok', 'sk': 'Nenadzorovano povzetek besedilnih dokumentov v bengalščini', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Bengali ཡི་གེའི་ཡིག་གེ་ཡིག་གེ་ལ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་མེད་པའི་Abstractive Summarization'}
{'en': 'Abstractive summarization systems generally rely on large collections of document-summary pairs. However, the performance of abstractive systems remains a challenge due to the unavailability of the parallel data for low-resource languages like Bengali. To overcome this problem, we propose a graph-based unsupervised abstractive summarization system in the single-document setting for Bengali text documents, which requires only a Part-Of-Speech (POS) tagger and a pre-trained language model trained on Bengali texts. We also provide a human-annotated dataset with document-summary pairs to evaluate our abstractive model and to support the comparison of future abstractive summarization systems of the Bengali Language. We conduct experiments on this dataset and compare our system with several well-established unsupervised extractive summarization systems. Our unsupervised abstractive summarization model outperforms the baselines without being exposed to any human-annotated reference summaries.', 'pt': 'Sistemas de sumarização abstrativos geralmente dependem de grandes coleções de pares de resumo de documento. No entanto, o desempenho de sistemas abstrativos continua sendo um desafio devido à indisponibilidade dos dados paralelos para linguagens de poucos recursos como o bengali. Para superar esse problema, propomos um sistema de sumarização abstrativo não supervisionado baseado em grafos na configuração de documento único para documentos de texto bengali, que requer apenas um tagger Part-Of-Speech (POS) e um modelo de linguagem pré-treinado treinado em textos bengalis . Também fornecemos um conjunto de dados anotado por humanos com pares de resumo-documento para avaliar nosso modelo abstrato e apoiar a comparação de futuros sistemas de sumarização abstrativos da língua bengali. Conduzimos experimentos neste conjunto de dados e comparamos nosso sistema com vários sistemas de sumarização extrativa não supervisionados bem estabelecidos. Nosso modelo de resumo abstrato não supervisionado supera as linhas de base sem ser exposto a nenhum resumo de referência anotado por humanos.', 'fr': "Les systèmes de synthèse abstraite reposent généralement sur de grandes collections de paires document-résumé. Cependant, la performance des systèmes abstraits reste un défi en raison de l'indisponibilité des données parallèles pour les langues à faibles ressources comme le bengali. Pour surmonter ce problème, nous proposons un système de résumé abstrait non supervisé basé sur des graphiques dans le cadre d'un seul document pour les documents texte bengali, qui nécessite uniquement un marqueur de partie du discours (POS) et un modèle de langage pré-formé formé sur des textes en bengali. Nous fournissons également un ensemble de données annoté par l'homme avec des paires document-résumé pour évaluer notre modèle abstrait et soutenir la comparaison des futurs systèmes de synthèse abstraite de la langue bengali. Nous menons des expériences sur cet ensemble de données et comparons notre système à plusieurs systèmes de synthèse extractive non supervisés bien établis. Notre modèle de synthèse abstraite non supervisée surpasse les lignes de base sans être exposé à des résumés de référence annotés par des humains.", 'es': 'Los sistemas de resumen abstractivo generalmente se basan en grandes colecciones de pares documento-resumen. Sin embargo, el rendimiento de los sistemas abstractivos sigue siendo un desafío debido a la falta de disponibilidad de los datos paralelos para idiomas de bajos recursos como el bengalí. Para superar este problema, proponemos un sistema de resumen abstractivo no supervisado basado en gráficos en la configuración de un solo documento para documentos de texto bengalí, que solo requiere un etiquetador de parte del habla (POS) y un modelo de idioma previamente entrenado y entrenado en textos bengalíes. También proporcionamos un conjunto de datos con anotaciones humanas con pares documento-resumen para evaluar nuestro modelo abstractivo y apoyar la comparación de futuros sistemas de resumen abstractivo del idioma bengalí. Llevamos a cabo experimentos con este conjunto de datos y comparamos nuestro sistema con varios sistemas de resumen extractivo no supervisados bien establecidos. Nuestro modelo de resumen abstractivo no supervisado supera a las líneas de base sin estar expuesto a ningún resumen de referencia anotado por humanos.', 'ja': '抽象的な要約システムは、一般に文書-要約ペアの大規模なコレクションに依存している。 しかし、ベンガル語のような低資源言語の並列データが利用できないため、抽象的なシステムのパフォーマンスは依然として課題である。 この問題を克服するために、私たちはベンガル語テキスト文書の単一文書設定で、グラフベースの無監督抽象化要約システムを提案します。これには、パート・オブ・スピーチ（ POS ）タガーと、ベンガル語テキストでトレーニングされた事前にトレーニングされた言語モデルのみが必要です。 また、抽象的なモデルを評価し、将来のベンガル語の抽象的な要約システムの比較をサポートするために、文書-要約ペアを備えた人間による注釈付きデータセットを提供します。 私たちはこのデータセットの実験を行い、当社のシステムをいくつかの確立された監督されていない抽出要約システムと比較します。 当社の監督なしの抽象的な要約モデルは、人間が注釈を付けた参照要約にさらされることなく、ベースラインを上回るパフォーマンスを発揮します。', 'ar': 'تعتمد أنظمة التلخيص التلخيصي عمومًا على مجموعات كبيرة من أزواج ملخصات المستندات. ومع ذلك ، لا يزال أداء الأنظمة التجريدية يمثل تحديًا بسبب عدم توفر البيانات المتوازية للغات منخفضة الموارد مثل البنغالية. للتغلب على هذه المشكلة ، نقترح نظام تلخيص تجريدي قائم على الرسم البياني غير خاضع للإشراف في إعداد المستند الفردي للمستندات النصية البنغالية ، والذي يتطلب فقط علامة جزء من الكلام (POS) ونموذج لغة مدرب مسبقًا تم تدريبه على النصوص البنغالية . نوفر أيضًا مجموعة بيانات مشروحة بشريًا مع أزواج ملخص للوثائق لتقييم نموذجنا التجريدي ولدعم مقارنة أنظمة التلخيص التجريدي المستقبلية للغة البنغالية. نجري تجارب على مجموعة البيانات هذه ونقارن نظامنا بالعديد من أنظمة التلخيص الاستخراجي الراسخة وغير الخاضعة للإشراف. يتفوق نموذج التلخيص التجريدي غير الخاضع للرقابة على خطوط الأساس دون التعرض لأي ملخصات مرجعية مشروحة من قبل الإنسان.', 'ru': 'Абстрактные системы обобщения, как правило, опираются на большие коллекции пар документ-суммирование. Тем не менее, производительность абстрактных систем остается проблемой из-за отсутствия параллельных данных для малоресурсных языков, таких как бенгальский. Чтобы преодолеть эту проблему, мы предлагаем систему неконтролируемого абстрактного обобщения на основе графов в однодокументной среде для текстов на бенгальском языке, которая требует только тегера Part-Of-Speech (POS) и предварительно обученной языковой модели, обученной на бенгальских текстах. Мы также предоставляем аннотированный человеком набор данных с парами документ-резюме для оценки нашей абстрактной модели и поддержки сравнения будущих систем абстрактного обобщения бенгальского языка. Мы проводим эксперименты с этим набором данных и сравниваем нашу систему с несколькими хорошо отлаженными неконтролируемыми системами извлечения. Наша неконтролируемая абстрактная модель обобщения превосходит базовые линии, не подвергаясь воздействию каких-либо аннотированных человеком справочных сводок.', 'zh': '抽象摘要系统常赖文档摘要对者大集。 然抽象系统之性犹一挑战,盖于孟加拉语等低资源语,并行数据不可用也。 所以克此者,孟加拉语文本档单文档设图无监抽象摘要统,只须一词性(POS)标器,与一孟加拉语文本训练言语模样。 给一带文档-摘要人工注数集,以质抽象模样,并支孟加拉语未来抽象摘要系统之较。 实验此数集,与成熟无监督摘要较之。 吾无监抽摘要模形优于基线,而不露于人工注释之摘要。', 'hi': 'Abstractive summarization सिस्टम आमतौर पर दस्तावेज़-सारांश जोड़े के बड़े संग्रह पर निर्भर करते हैं। हालांकि, बांग्ला जैसी कम संसाधन वाली भाषाओं के लिए समानांतर डेटा की अनुपलब्धता के कारण अमूर्त प्रणालियों का प्रदर्शन एक चुनौती बना हुआ है। इस समस्या को दूर करने के लिए, हम बंगाली पाठ दस्तावेजों के लिए एकल-दस्तावेज़ सेटिंग में एक ग्राफ-आधारित अप्रशिक्षित अमूर्त सारांशीकरण प्रणाली का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिसके लिए केवल एक पार्ट-ऑफ-स्पीच (पीओएस) टैगर और बंगाली ग्रंथों पर प्रशिक्षित एक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल की आवश्यकता होती है। हम अपने अमूर्त मॉडल का मूल्यांकन करने और बंगाली भाषा के भविष्य के अमूर्त सारांश प्रणालियों की तुलना का समर्थन करने के लिए दस्तावेज़-सारांश जोड़े के साथ एक मानव-एनोटेट डेटासेट भी प्रदान करते हैं। हम इस डेटासेट पर प्रयोग करते हैं और कई अच्छी तरह से स्थापित असुरक्षित निष्कर्षण सारांशण प्रणालियों के साथ हमारे सिस्टम की तुलना करते हैं। हमारा असुरक्षित अमूर्त सारांश मॉडल किसी भी मानव-एनोटेट संदर्भ सारांश के संपर्क में आने के बिना बेसलाइन को मात देता है।', 'ga': 'Go ginearálta bíonn córais achoimrithe teibí ag brath ar bhailiúcháin mhóra de phéirí doiciméad-achoimre. Mar sin féin, is dúshlán fós é feidhmíocht na gcóras teibí toisc nach bhfuil na sonraí comhthreomhara ar fáil do theangacha íseal-acmhainne mar Bheangáilis. Chun an fhadhb seo a shárú, molaimid córas achoimrithe teibí gan mhaoirseacht ar ghraif sa socrú aon-doiciméid do dhoiciméid téacs Beangáilis, nach dteastaíonn ach clibeálaí Cuid de Caint (POS) agus múnla teanga réamh-oilte oilte ar théacsanna Beangáilise. . Soláthraímid freisin tacar sonraí daonna-anótáilte mar aon le péirí achoimre doiciméad chun ár múnla teibí a mheas agus chun tacú le comparáid a dhéanamh idir córais achoimrithe teibí na Teanga Beangáilis amach anseo. Déanaimid turgnaimh ar an tacar sonraí seo agus cuirimid ár gcóras i gcomparáid le go leor córas achoimrithe eastósctha gan mhaoirseacht atá bunaithe go maith. Is fearr lenár samhail achoimre teibí gan mhaoirseacht ná na bunlínte gan a bheith faoi lé aon achoimrí tagartha daonna-nótáilte.', 'hu': 'Az absztrakt összefoglaló rendszerek általában a dokumentum-összefoglaló párok nagy gyűjteményére támaszkodnak. Az absztraktív rendszerek teljesítménye azonban továbbra is kihívást jelent, mivel nem állnak rendelkezésre párhuzamos adatok az alacsony erőforrású nyelvek, mint például a bengáli nyelvek esetében. A probléma megoldása érdekében a bengáli szöveges dokumentumok egydokumentumos beállításában diagramalapú, felügyelet nélküli absztrakt összefoglaló rendszert javasolunk, amely csak egy beszédrészes (POS) címkézőt és egy bengáli szövegekre képzett előkészített nyelvi modellt igényel. Az absztraktív modellünk értékeléséhez és a bengáli nyelv jövőbeli absztraktív összefoglaló rendszereinek összehasonlításához szükséges dokumentum-összefoglaló párokkal rendelkező emberi jegyzetekkel ellátott adatkészletet is biztosítunk. Ezen adatkészleten kísérleteket végzünk, és rendszerünket több jól bevált, felügyelet nélküli extraktív összefoglaló rendszerrel hasonlítjuk össze. Felügyelet nélküli absztraktív összefoglaló modellünk felülmúlja az alapvonalakat anélkül, hogy emberi jegyzetekkel ellátott referenciaösszefoglalóknak lennénk kitéve.', 'it': "I sistemi di sintesi astratta generalmente si basano su grandi raccolte di coppie di documenti-sintesi. Tuttavia, le prestazioni dei sistemi astratti rimangono una sfida a causa dell'indisponibilità dei dati paralleli per lingue a basso contenuto di risorse come il bengalese. Per ovviare a questo problema, proponiamo un sistema di sintesi astratta non supervisionato basato su grafici nell'impostazione del singolo documento per i documenti di testo bengalesi, che richiede solo un tag Part-Of-Speech (POS) e un modello linguistico pre-addestrato addestrato sui testi bengalesi. Forniamo anche un set di dati con annotazioni umane con coppie di documenti-sintesi per valutare il nostro modello astratto e per supportare il confronto dei futuri sistemi di sintesi astratta della lingua bengalese. Conduciamo esperimenti su questo set di dati e confrontiamo il nostro sistema con diversi sistemi di sintesi estrattiva non supervisionati ben consolidati. Il nostro modello di sintesi astratta non supervisionato supera le linee di base senza essere esposto a nessun riassunto di riferimento annotato dall'uomo.", 'el': 'Τα συστήματα αφηρημένης σύνοψης γενικά βασίζονται σε μεγάλες συλλογές ζευγαριών εγγράφων-σύνοψης. Ωστόσο, η απόδοση των αφηρημένων συστημάτων παραμένει πρόκληση λόγω της μη διαθεσιμότητας των παράλληλων δεδομένων για γλώσσες χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας σε πόρους όπως τα Βεγγαλικά. Για να ξεπεραστεί αυτό το πρόβλημα, προτείνουμε ένα σύστημα αφηρημένης σύνοψης βασισμένο σε γραφήματα χωρίς επίβλεψη στη ρύθμιση ενός εγγράφου για έγγραφα κειμένου της Βεγγάλης, το οποίο απαιτεί μόνο ένα δείκτη τμήματος ομιλίας (και ένα προσχεδιασμένο μοντέλο γλώσσας εκπαιδευμένο σε κείμενα της Βεγγάλης. Παρέχουμε επίσης ένα σύνολο δεδομένων με σχόλια από άνθρωπο με ζεύγη εγγράφων-σύνοψης για να αξιολογήσουμε το αφηρημένο μοντέλο μας και να υποστηρίξουμε τη σύγκριση μελλοντικών συστημάτων αφηρημένης σύνοψης της Βεγγαλικής Γλώσσας. Διεξάγουμε πειράματα σε αυτό το σύνολο δεδομένων και συγκρίνουμε το σύστημά μας με αρκετά καθιερωμένα χωρίς επίβλεψη συστήματα εξαγωγικής σύνοψης. Το χωρίς επίβλεψη αφηρημένο μοντέλο σύνοψής μας ξεπερνά τις γραμμές βάσης χωρίς να εκτίθεται σε περιλήψεις αναφοράς με σχόλια από ανθρώπους.', 'kk': 'Абстрактивті тұжырымдама жүйелері әдетте құжат тұжырымдамасының үлкен жиындарына тәуелді. Бірақ абстрактивтік жүйелердің істеуі бенгали секілді төмен ресурстар тілдерінің параллель деректерінің қол жеткізбейтіні себебі әсер етілген. Бұл мәселеді көтеру үшін біз бенгали мәтін құжаттарының бір құжатты баптау үшін графикалық негіздеген абстрактивті тұжырымдау жүйесін ұсынамыз. Бұл тек сөздің бөлігі (POS) тегжері мен бенгали мәтіндерінде оқылған алдын-  Сонымен қатар, біз бенгали тілінің келесі абстрактивті үлгілерімізді бағалау үшін құжат тұжырымдамасы қолданатын деректер жиынын адамдардың белгіленген деректер жиынын қолданатын. Біз бұл деректер жиынында тәжірибелер істеп жүйемізді бірнеше жақсы құрылмаған жүйелерімен салыстырамыз. Біздің абстрактивті жазылу үлгіміз адамдардың жазылмаған сілтемелеріне қосылмай, негізгі жолдардың негізгі жолдарын жасайды.', 'mk': 'Апстрактивни системи за резултати генерално зависат од големи колекции на парови со резултати на документите. Сепак, изведувањето на апстрактивните системи останува предизвик поради недостигноста на паралелните податоци за јазици со ниски ресурси како Бенгали. За да го надминеме овој проблем, предложуваме систем на ненадгледувана апстрактивна резултатација базиран на график во поставувањето на еден документ за бенгалиски текст документи, кој бара само означувач на дел од говорот (POS) и предобучен јазички модел обучен на бенгалиски тексти. Ние, исто така, обезбедуваме човек-анотиран податок со парови документи-сумирање за да го процениме нашиот апстрактивен модел и да го поддржиме споредбата на идните апстрактивни системи на сумирање на бенгалискиот јазик. Ние спроведуваме експерименти на овој податок и го споредуваме нашиот систем со неколку добро воспоставени ненадгледувани системи за извлекување резултати. Нашиот ненадгледуван апстрактивен модел на резултати ги надминува базите без да бидат изложени на било какви референтни резултати кои се анотирани од човекот.', 'ka': 'აბსტრაქტიური სისტემები სისტემები უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია დოკუმენტის სისტემების დიდი კოლექციაზე. მაგრამ აბსტრაქტიგური სისტემის შესაძლებლობა დარჩენა პერალელი მონაცემებების არ შესაძლებელობა, როგორც ბენდალის სახელსაწყისთვის. ამ პრობლემას გადავიწყოთ, ჩვენ განვითარებთ განსხვავებული არსხვავებული აბსტრაქტიური სისტემას ბენდალის ტექსტის დოკუმენტის განსაზღვრებით, რომელიც მხოლოდ ბენდალის ტექსტის ნაწილეობის (POS) ჭდერი და პრეტრაქტიური ენა ჩვენ ასევე ადამიანის ანოტირებული მონაცემების კომპონტაქტიური კომპონტაქტიური მოდელის შესაბამისთვის და ბენდალის ენისთვის მომავლის აბსტრაქტიური სისტემის შესაბამისთვის დამხმარე ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტები ამ მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში გავაკეთებთ და ჩვენი სისტემას რამდენიმე კონფიგურაციული ექსპერიმენტი კონფიგურაციის სი ჩვენი არსებული აბსტრაქტიური რესუმენტიფიკაციის მოდელი უფრო მეტად გავაკეთება ბაზულ ხაზების გარეშე, რომელიც არ იყოს ადამიანის რესუმენტის რესუმენტის რე', 'ms': 'Sistem ringkasan abstraktif biasanya bergantung pada koleksi besar pasangan ringkasan dokumen. Namun, prestasi sistem abstraktif tetap satu cabaran kerana tidak tersedia data selari untuk bahasa sumber rendah seperti Bengali. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami cadangkan sistem ringkasan abstraktif tidak diawasi berdasarkan graf dalam tetapan dokumen tunggal untuk dokumen teks Bengali, yang memerlukan hanya tag Part-Of-Speech (POS) dan model bahasa terlatih terlatih pada teks Bengali. Kami juga menyediakan set data anotasi manusia dengan pasangan ringkasan dokumen untuk menilai model abstraktif kami dan untuk menyokong perbandingan sistem ringkasan abstraktif masa depan bahasa Bengali. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada set data ini dan membandingkan sistem kami dengan beberapa sistem pengiraan ekstraktif yang tidak diawasi dengan baik. Our unsupervised abstractive summarization model outperforms the baselines without being exposed to any human-annotated reference summaries.', 'lt': 'Abstraktyvios santraukų sistemos paprastai grindžiamos dideliais dokumentų santraukų poros rinkiniais. Tačiau abstraktinių sistemų veiksmingumas tebėra iššūkis dėl to, kad nėra lygiagrečių duomenų mažai išteklių turinčioms kalboms, pvz., bengalų kalboms. Siekiant išspręsti šią problem ą, siūlome vienkartinio dokumento Bengalų tekstų dokumentų suvestinės sistemą, grindžiamą grafu, kurioje reikalingas tik žodžio dalis (POS) žymeklis ir iš anksto parengtas kalbos modelis, mokomas bengalų tekstais. Taip pat teikiame žmogaus anotuotą duomenų rinkinį su dokumentų santraukų poromis, kad įvertintume mūsų abstraktinį model į ir paremtume būsimų abstraktinių Bengalų kalbos santraukų sistemų palyginimą. Atliekame eksperimentus su šiuo duomenų rinkiniu ir palyginame savo sistemą su keliomis gerai sukurtomis nepastebimomis ekstraktyvinės santraukos sistemomis. Mūsų nepastebimas abstraktiškas santraukų apibendrinimo modelis viršija bazines vertes, tačiau nėra susijęs su jokiomis žmogaus anotuotomis referencinėmis santraukomis.', 'mt': 'Sistemi abstrattivi ta’ sommarju ġeneralment jiddependu fuq kollezzjonijiet kbar ta’ pari ta’ sommarju tad-dokumenti. Madankollu, il-prestazzjoni tas-sistemi astratti tibqa’ sfida minħabba n-nuqqas ta’ disponibbiltà tad-dejta parallel a għal lingwi b’riżorsi baxxi bħall-Bengali. Biex tingħeleb din il-problem a, qed nipproponu sistema ta’ sommarju astrattiv mhux sorveljata bbażata fuq il-grafika fl-istabbiliment ta’ dokument uniku għad-dokumenti tat-test tal-Bengali, li teħtieġ biss tikkettatur Part-Of-Speech (POS) u mudell lingwistiku mħarreġ minn qabel fuq it-testi tal-Bengali. Aħna nipprovdu wkoll sett ta’ dejta annotata mill-bniedem b’par ta’ dokumenti-sommarji biex jevalwaw il-mudell astrattiv tagħna u biex nappoġġjaw it-tqabbil ta’ sistemi ta’ sommarju astrattiv futuri tal-Lingwa Bengali. Aħna nagħmlu esperimenti fuq dan is-sett ta’ dejta u nqabblu s-sistema tagħna ma’ diversi sistemi ta’ sommarju estrattiv mhux sorveljati stabbiliti sewwa. Il-mudell ta’ sommarju astrattiv tagħna mhux sorveljat jaqbeż il-linji bażi mingħajr ma jkun espost għal xi sommarji ta’ referenza annotati mill-bniedem.', 'pl': 'Systemy streszczenia abstrakcyjnego zazwyczaj opierają się na dużych zbiorach par dokument-streszczenie. Wydajność systemów abstrakcyjnych pozostaje jednak wyzwaniem ze względu na brak dostępności danych równoległych dla języków o niskim zasobie, takich jak bengalski. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, proponujemy oparty na wykresie system abstrakcyjnego streszczenia abstrakcyjnego bez nadzoru w ustawieniu pojedynczego dokumentu dla bengalskich dokumentów tekstowych, który wymaga tylko tagera części mowy (POS) i wstępnie przeszkolonego modelu językowego przeszkolonego na tekstach bengalskich. Dostarczamy również zbiór danych z adnotacją człowieka z parami dokumentów-podsumowania, aby ocenić nasz model abstrakcyjny i wspierać porównanie przyszłych abstrakcyjnych systemów podsumowania języka bengalskiego. Przeprowadzamy eksperymenty na tym zbiorze danych i porównujemy nasz system z kilkoma ugruntowanymi bez nadzoru systemami ekstrakcyjnych podsumowań. Nasz nienadzorowany model abstrakcyjnego podsumowania przewyższa linię bazową bez narażenia na jakiekolwiek podsumowania referencyjne opisane przez człowieka.', 'ml': 'അബ്സ്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്ടിവിന്റെ സംഖ്യ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d പൊതുവായി രേഖപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന വലിയ സംഘട്ടങ് എങ്കിലും ബെങ്കാലിയെ പോലുള്ള അളവിലുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ലഭ്യമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമല്ലാത്തതിനാല്\u200d അസാധ്യതയുള്ള സിസ്റ്റം പ്ര To overcome this problem, we propose a graph-based unsupervised abstractive summarization system in the single-document setting for Bengali text documents, which requires only a Part-Of-Speech (POS) tagger and a pre-trained language model trained on Bengali texts.  നമ്മുടെ പ്രത്യേക മോഡലിനെ പരിശോധിക്കാനും ഭാവിയിലെ അസാധ്യതയില്ലാത്ത വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സംവിധാനങ്ങളെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കാനും നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു മനുഷ്യന്റെ വിവ ഈ ഡാറ്റാസസെറ്റില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തുകയും, നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിനെ കൂടുതല്\u200d സംരക്ഷിക്കാത്ത കുറച്ച് സംരക്ഷണ നമ്മുടെ അസംരക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത സംസാരിക്കാനുള്ള സാധ്യതയില്ലാത്ത മോഡല്\u200d ബേസ്ലൈന്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. മനുഷ്യന്\u200d', 'sr': 'Abstraktivni sažetački sistem se uglavnom oslanja na velike kolekcije sažetnih par dokumenta. Međutim, provedba abstraktivnih sustava ostaje izazov zbog nedostupnosti paralelnih podataka za jezike niskih resursa poput Bengalija. Za prevladanje ovog problem a predlažemo sistem neodređenog abstraktivnog sažetanja na grafiku u postavljanju jednodokumenta za tekstske dokumente Bengalija, koji zahteva samo merker deo govora (POS) i predobučeni jezički model obučen na tekstima Bengalija. Također pružamo i ljudskom spoju podataka sa sažetnim parovima za procjenu našeg abstraktivnog model a i podržavanje usporedbe budućih abstraktivnih sustava sažetanja Bengalijskog jezika. Vodimo eksperimente na ovom setu podataka i usporedimo naš sistem sa nekoliko dobro uspostavljenih ekstraktivnih sustava za sažetak. Naš neodređeni model abstraktivne sažetke iznosi osnovne linije bez izloženosti bilo kojim sažetkama referenta na ljudima.', 'no': 'Abstraktive samanseringssystemer har generelt bruk på store samlingar av dokumentsamansettingspar. Men utviklinga av abstraktive systemar er likevel eit utfordring på grunn av ikkje tilgjengeleg parallelle data for låg ressursspråk som Bengali. For å overføra dette problemet, foreslår vi eit grafikkbasert usikkert abstraktiv samandringssystem i det enkelte dokumentinnstillinga for Bengaliske tekstdokument, som krev berre ein del av tale (POS) merker og eit før- treng språk- modell som treng på Bengaliske tekstar. Vi tilbyr også ein dataset med menneskeoppmerkingar med samandrag for dokument for å evaluere abstraktiv modell vårt og for å støtte sammenligninga med framtidige abstraktive samandringssystemar i Bengaliske språk. Vi gjer eksperimenter på denne dataset og samanliknar systemet vårt med fleire godt utvikla ekstraktiv samanseringssystemer. Vårt ugjennomsiktig abstraktiv sammendragsmodul utfører baselinjene utan å bli eksponert til alle menneskelige referanssamandringar.', 'mn': 'Абстрактив дүгнэлтийн систем нь баримт дүгнэлтийн хоорондын том цуглуулга дээр байдаг. Гэхдээ хэзээ ч, абстрактив системийн үйл ажиллагаа Бенгали шиг бага нөөцийн хэлний төлөвлөгөөний параллел өгөгдлийн боломжгүй болохоор л байдаг. Энэ асуудлыг дутагдахын тулд бид график дээр суурилсан абстрактив тодорхойлолтын системийг Бенгалийн текст баримтын нэг баримтын тодорхойлолтын тулд санал болгож байна. Энэ нь зөвхөн ярианы хэсэг (POS) тегжер болон Бенгалийн текст дээр сургалтын өмнө сургалтын хэл за Бид мөн хүн төрөлхтний анзаарсан өгөгдлийн сангуудыг бичил дээр хэвлэгдэх хэлбэртэй холбоотой. Бидний abstractive загварыг үнэлэх, ирээдүйн abstractive summarization системийн харьцуулахыг дэмжих. Бид энэ өгөгдлийн сан дээр туршилтыг хийж, системийг олон сайн байгуулагдсан гайхалтай жишээлтэй системтэй харьцуулж байна. Бидний хариуцлагагүй тодорхойлолтын загвар нь хүн төрөлхтний тодорхойлолтой тодорхойлолтой тодорхойлолтоос гадна суурь шулуунуудыг дамжуулдаг.', 'ro': 'Sistemele de rezumare abstractă se bazează, în general, pe colecții mari de perechi de documente-rezumat. Cu toate acestea, performanța sistemelor abstractive rămâne o provocare datorită indisponibilității datelor paralele pentru limbi cu resurse reduse precum bengali. Pentru a depăși această problemă, propunem un sistem de rezumare abstractivă nesupravegheată bazat pe grafice în setarea unui singur document pentru documentele text bengaleze, care necesită doar un etichetor Part-Of-Speech (POS) și un model lingvistic pre-instruit pe texte bengaleze. De asemenea, oferim un set de date adnotat uman cu perechi de document-rezumat pentru a evalua modelul nostru abstractiv și pentru a sprijini compararea viitoarelor sisteme de rezumare abstractivă a limbii bengaleze. Realizăm experimente pe acest set de date și comparăm sistemul nostru cu mai multe sisteme de sintetizare extractivă bine stabilite, nesupravegheate. Modelul nostru de rezumare abstractivă nesupravegheat depășește liniile de referință fără a fi expus la rezumate de referință adnotate de om.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය සංවේදනය පද්ධතිය සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂයෙන් විශාල සම්බන්ධයක් ලොකු සම්බන්ධයෙන් විශ නමුත්, බෙන්ගාලි වගේ අඩුම භාෂාවක් වගේ සාමාන්\u200dය දත්ත අවස්ථාවක් නැති නිසා අවස්ථාවක් තියෙනවා. මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න, අපි බෙන්ගාලි පාළුම් දස්තාව සඳහා ග්\u200dරාෆ් අධාරිත නොප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සංස්ථාපනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා, බෙන්ගාලි  අපි මිනිස්සුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් කරනවා බෙන්ගාලි භාෂාවේ අනාගතයේ අනාගතයේ සාමා අපි මේ තොරතුරු සෙට් එක්ක පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න සහ අපේ පද්ධතිය හොඳ ස්ථාපනයක් නැති විශේෂ විශේෂ පද්ධතිය සම අපේ නැතිවිශ්වාස කරපු ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරමාණය නිසා මිනිස්සු ප්\u200dරමාණය සම්බන්ධයකට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා', 'ta': 'Abstractive சுருக்கம் அமைப்புகள் பொதுவாக ஆவண- சுருக்கம் ஜோடியை சார்ந்திருக்கும். ஆனால் பெங்காலி போன்ற குறைந்த மூலம் மொழிகளுக்கு இணைய தரவு கிடைக்காமல் இருக்கும் காரணத்தால் செயல்படுத்தும் அமைப்புகளின் ச இந்த பிரச்சனையை வெற்றுவதற்கு, நாம் பெங்காலி உரை ஆவணங்களுக்கான ஒரே ஆவண அமைப்பில் வரைபடத்தில் பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத மற்றும் பெங்காலி உரைகளில் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரி ம நாம் ஒரு மனிதன் அறிவிக்கப்பட்ட தகவல் அமைப்பை கொடுக்கிறோம் ஆவண- சுருக்கம் ஜோடிகளை மதிப்பிட மற்றும் பெங்காலி மொழியின் எதிர்கால செயல்படுத்தும்  We conduct experiments on this dataset and compare our system with several well-established unsupervised extractive summarization systems.  எங்கள் பாதுகாப்பாற்றப்படாத சுருக்கம் மாதிரி எந்த மனிதனும் குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பு சுருக்கங்களுக்கும் தெரியாது அடிப்பட', 'so': "Sida caadiga ah nidaamka soo jimicsiga waxay ku xiran yihiin ururo badan oo wada noocyo qoraal ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, sameynta nidaamka cayilnaanta ah waa mid dhibaato ah sababtoo ah aysan helin macluumaadka u eg luqadaha hoose-resource sida Bengali. Si aan dhibaatadan uga adkaado, waxaan u soo jeedaynaa nidaam oo aan xafiiska u dhignayn oo aan u sameyneyn karayn, oo u qoran qoraalka qoraalka oo kaliya ee Bengali, kaas oo u baahan qayb-Of-Speech (POS) iyo model af-tababar ah oo ku tababaray qoraalka Bengali. Waxaynu sidoo kale siinaynaa koob macluumaad ku qoran dadka oo ku qoran labada noocyo oo xafiiska ah si aan u qiimeyno modelkeenna aan rasmi lahayn iyo in aan u kaalmeyno isbarbardhigga nidaamka soo jiidashada afka Bengaliga. Waxaynu sameynaa imtixaan sawiradan, waxaynu isbarbardhignaa nidaamka oo aad u sawiranaysay si fiican oo aan u sameyn nidaamka soo saarista. Tusaale'dayada aan la ilaalinayn oo aan la ilaalin karin wuxuu soo bandhigaa aasaaska iyadoo aan lagu arag dhamaan dhamaan summariyada reference ee dadka.", 'sv': 'Abstraktiva sammanfattningssystem förlitar sig i allmänhet på stora samlingar av dokument-sammanfattningspar. Prestandan för abstrakta system är dock fortfarande en utmaning på grund av bristen på parallella data för lågresursspråk som bengali. För att lösa detta problem föreslår vi ett grafbaserat, oövervakat abstrakt sammanfattningssystem i enhetsdokumentsinställningen för bengaliska textdokument, som endast kräver en POS-taggare (Part-Of-Speech) och en färdigutbildad språkmodell utbildad på bengaliska texter. Vi tillhandahåller också en mänsklig-kommenterad datauppsättning med dokument-sammanfattning par för att utvärdera vår abstrakta modell och för att stödja jämförelsen av framtida abstrakta sammanfattningssystem av Bengali språket. Vi utför experiment på denna datauppsättning och jämför vårt system med flera väletablerade icke övervakade extraktiva sammanfattningssystem. Vår oövervakade abstrakta sammanfattningsmodell överträffar baselines utan att utsättas för några mänskliga kommenterade referenssammanfattningar.', 'ur': 'آبٹراکتیوں سیستموں کی عمومی طور پر دلیل-ساری جوڑوں کی بڑی جماعتیں پر اعتماد رکھتے ہیں. لیکن بنگلی جیسی کم منبع زبانوں کے لئے پارالٹ ڈیٹے کے غیر قابل حاصل کرنے کے باعث ایک چال ہے۔ اس مسئلہ پر غالب ہونے کے لئے ہم ایک گراف کی بنیادی غیرقابل غیرقابل غیرقابل غیرقابل غیرقابل تعلیم سیستم کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں بنگالی ٹیکسٹ ڈیکسٹ ڈیکسٹ کے لئے، جو صرف ایک ٹیگگر (POS) کا حصہ اور بنگالی ٹیکسٹ پر آموزش کی جاتی ہے۔ ہم نے بھی ایک انسان کے ذریعہ ذریعہ دکھانے والی ڈیٹ سٹ کو دکھانے والی ذریعہ جوڑوں کے ساتھ پیش کیا ہے کہ ہمارے ذریعہ مدل کا ارزش کریں اور بنگلی زبان کی آینده ذریعہ ذریعہ سیستم کی مقایسہ کی مدد کریں۔ ہم اس ڈیٹ سٹ پر آزمائش کرتے ہیں اور ہمارے سیستم کو چند بہترین مضبوط غیرقابل تعمیر سیستموں سے مقایسہ کرتے ہیں۔ ہمارے غیرقابل غیرقابل غیرقابل غیرقابل غیرقابل غیر قابل تعریف کے ذریعہ کسی انسان کے ذریعہ سے اظہار نہیں کیا جاتا۔', 'uz': 'Name Lekin, abstraktiv tizimlar bajarishi balki Bengallik kabi lavha resource tillari uchun parametrlar maʼlumoti yetarlicha emas sababda murakkab bo\'ladi. Bu muammolani oshirish uchun biz Bengali matn hujjatlari uchun bitta qoʻllanilmaydigan grafik asosida xavfsiz qilmagan abstraktiv hisobot tizimini tahrirlash talab qilamiz. Bu tilni faqat "POS" qismlari (POS) yordamchisi va bengali matnlarida o\'rganilgan bir oldingi o\'rganish modeli kerak. Biz o\'zimizning asosiy modelimizni qiymatish va kelajakdagi obraktiv hisoblash tizimini qiymatga qo\'shish uchun qoʻllanmiz. Biz bu maʼlumotlar sahifadagi tajribalarni bajaramiz va tizimmizni bir necha yaxshi saqlab qolmagan ajratish tizimlariga kamaytamiz. Bizning saqlanmagan abstraktiv hisoblash modeli asosiy tuzuvlarini bajaradi va hech qanday qo\'l bilan hech qanday bog\'liq hisoblanmagan xabarlarni ko\'rsatish mumkin.', 'vi': 'Các hệ thống tóm tắt lạm dụng thường dựa trên các tập hợp đầy đủ các cặp tài liệu. Tuy nhiên, khả năng của hệ thống trừu tượng vẫn là một thử thách do không có dữ liệu song cho ngôn ngữ ít tài nguyên như Bengali. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề nghị một hệ thống tóm tắt trừu tượng dựa vào đồ thị trong thiết lập văn bản đơn cho tài liệu của Bengali, mà chỉ cần một phần-of-Speech (POS) tagger (POS) và một mô hình ngôn ngữ được đào tạo về văn bản Bengali. Chúng tôi cung cấp một bộ dữ liệu ghi chú con người với cặp hồ sơ tóm tắt tài liệu để đánh giá mẫu trừu tượng của chúng ta và hỗ trợ việc so sánh hệ thống tóm tắt trừu tượng tương lai của ngôn ngữ Bengal. Chúng tôi tiến hành thí nghiệm trên bộ dữ liệu này và so sánh hệ thống với một vài hệ thống khai thác chưa được giám sát. Bản tóm tắt không được giám sát của chúng ta hoàn thiện bản gốc mà không bị phơi bày bởi các bản tóm tắt ghi chú con người.', 'bg': 'Системите за абстрактивно обобщаване обикновено разчитат на големи колекции от двойки документи-обобщения. Въпреки това, ефективността на абстрактните системи остава предизвикателство поради липсата на паралелни данни за езици с нисък ресурс като бенгалски. За да преодолеем този проблем, предлагаме графична система за абстрактно обобщаване в настройката на единичен документ за бенгалски текстови документи, която изисква само маркер за част от речта (ПОС) и предварително обучен езиков модел, обучен върху бенгалски текстове. Ние също така предоставяме набор от данни с анотирани от човека двойки документи-резюмета, за да оценим нашия абстрактен модел и да подкрепим сравнението на бъдещите абстрактни системи за обобщаване на бенгалския език. Провеждаме експерименти с този набор от данни и сравняваме нашата система с няколко добре установени, неподготвени екстрактивни системи за обобщаване. Нашият ненадзорен абстрактен модел на обобщаване надминава базовите линии, без да бъде изложен на каквито и да било референтни резюмета с анотация на хора.', 'hr': 'Abstraktivni sustavi sažetka općenito se oslanjaju na velike kolekcije sažetnih par dokumenta. Međutim, učinkovitost apstraktivnih sustava ostaje izazov zbog nedostupnosti paralelnih podataka za jezike niskih resursa poput Bengalija. Za prevladanje ovog problem a predlažemo sistem nepotrebnog abstraktivnog sažetka na grafiku u jednodokumentnom postavljanju tekstskih dokumenta Bengalija, koji zahtijeva samo označavač dijela govora (POS) i predobučeni jezički model obučen na tekstima Bengalija. Također pružamo i ljudski spoj podataka s sažetkom dokumenta za procjenu našeg apstraktivnog model a i podržavanje usporedbe budućih abstraktivnih sustava sažetka Bengalskog jezika. Mi provodimo eksperimente na ovom setu podataka i uspoređujemo naš sustav s nekoliko dobro uspostavljenih ekstraktivnih sustava za sažetak. Naš neodređeni model abstraktivne sažetke iznosi početne linije bez izloženosti bilo kojim sažetkama referenta na ljudima.', 'da': 'Abstraktive opsummeringssystemer er generelt afhængige af store samlinger af dokument-opsummeringspar. Men resultaterne af abstrakte systemer er fortsat en udfordring på grund af manglende tilgængelighed af parallelle data for lav ressource sprog som bengali. For at løse dette problem foreslår vi et grafbaseret, uautoriseret abstrakt opsummeringssystem i enkeltdokumentindstillingen for bengaliske tekstdokumenter, som kun kræver en POS-tagger (Part-Of-Speech) og en forududdannet sprogmodel trænet i bengaliske tekster. Vi leverer også et menneskeligt annoteret datasæt med dokument-resumépar til at evaluere vores abstrakte model og til at understøtte sammenligningen af fremtidige abstrakte resumésystemer af Bengali sprog. Vi gennemfører eksperimenter på dette datasæt og sammenligner vores system med flere veletablerede, uautoriserede ekstraktive summeringssystemer. Vores uautoriserede abstrakte opsummeringsmodel overgår basislinjerne uden at blive udsat for nogen menneskelig-kommenterede referenceresuméer.', 'nl': 'Abstractieve samenvattingssystemen vertrouwen over het algemeen op grote collecties document-samenvattingsparen. De prestaties van abstractieve systemen blijven echter een uitdaging vanwege de onbeschikbaarheid van de parallelle gegevens voor low-resource talen zoals Bengaals. Om dit probleem op te lossen, stellen we een grafiek-gebaseerd abstractief samenvattingssysteem voor in de instelling voor één document voor Bengaalse tekstdocumenten voor, dat alleen een Part-Of-Speech (POS) tagger en een vooraf getraind taalmodel vereist dat is getraind op Bengaalse teksten. We bieden ook een door mensen geannoteerde dataset met document-samenvattingsparen om ons abstractief model te evalueren en de vergelijking van toekomstige abstractieve samenvattingssystemen van de Bengaalse taal te ondersteunen. We voeren experimenten uit op deze dataset en vergelijken ons systeem met verschillende gevestigde, onbeheerde extractieve samenvattingssystemen. Ons onbeheerde abstracte samenvattingsmodel overtreft de basislijnen zonder blootgesteld te worden aan door mensen geannoteerde referentiesamenvattingen.', 'de': 'Abstraktive Zusammenfassungssysteme basieren in der Regel auf großen Sammlungen von Dokument-Zusammenfassung Paaren. Die Leistungsfähigkeit abstrakter Systeme bleibt jedoch eine Herausforderung, da die parallelen Daten für ressourcenarme Sprachen wie Bengali nicht verfügbar sind. Um dieses Problem zu lösen, schlagen wir ein graphenbasiertes, nicht überwachtes abstraktes Zusammenfassungssystem in der Einzeldokumenteinstellung für bengalische Textdokumente vor, das nur einen Part-Of-Speech (POS) Tagger und ein vortrainiertes Sprachmodell benötigt, das auf bengalischen Texten trainiert ist. Wir stellen auch einen human-annotierten Datensatz mit Dokument-Zusammenfassung Paaren zur Verfügung, um unser abstraktives Modell zu bewerten und den Vergleich zukünftiger abstraktiver Zusammenfassungssysteme der Bengalischen Sprache zu unterstützen. Wir führen Experimente an diesem Datensatz durch und vergleichen unser System mit einigen etablierten unüberwachten extraktiven Zusammenfassungssystemen. Unser unbeaufsichtigtes abstraktes Zusammenfassungsmodell übertrifft die Basislinien, ohne dass es irgendeinen von Menschen annotierten Referenzzusammenfassungen ausgesetzt ist.', 'id': 'Sistem penerangan abstraktif umumnya bergantung pada koleksi besar dari pasangan penerangan dokumen. However, the performance of abstractive systems remains a challenge due to the unavailability of the parallel data for low-resource languages like Bengali.  Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami mengusulkan sistem abstraksi tidak diawasi berdasarkan grafik dalam pengaturan dokumen tunggal untuk dokumen teks Bengali, yang membutuhkan hanya tagger Part-Of-Speech (POS) dan model bahasa terlatih terlatih pada teks Bengali. Kami juga menyediakan set data anotasi manusia dengan pasangan dokumen-ringkasan untuk mengevaluasi model abstraktif kami dan untuk mendukung perbandingan dari sistem ringkasan abstraktif masa depan Bahasa Bengali. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada set data ini dan membandingkan sistem kami dengan beberapa sistem ekstraktif tidak diawasi dengan baik. Model penglihatan abstraktif kita yang tidak diawasi melebihi garis dasar tanpa terkena penglihatan referensi apapun yang dicatat oleh manusia.', 'ko': '요약 시스템은 통상적으로 대량의 문서 요약 쌍에 의존한다.그러나 방글라데시어와 같은 저자원 언어는 병행 데이터를 얻지 못하기 때문에 추상적인 시스템의 성능은 여전히 도전이다.이 문제를 극복하기 위해 우리는 그림을 바탕으로 하는 무감독의 방글라데시 어문본 요약 시스템을 제시했다. 그것은 단어성 표기기와 훈련을 받은 방글라데시 어문본 언어 모델만 있으면 된다.우리는 또한 문서 요약이 있는 인공 주석 데이터 집합을 제공하여 우리의 추상 모델을 평가하고 미래 방글라데시어 추상 요약 시스템의 비교를 지원한다.우리는 이 데이터 집합에서 실험을 하고 우리의 시스템을 몇 개의 성숙한 무감독 추출 요약 시스템과 비교했다.우리의 무감독 추상적 요약 모델은 어떠한 인류 주석의 참고 요약에도 노출되지 않는 상황에서 기선보다 우수하다.', 'fa': 'سیستم\u200cهای جمع\u200cآوری مطلق عمومی بر جمع\u200cآوری بزرگ جفت\u200cهای جمع\u200cآوری سند اعتماد می\u200cکنند. ولی عملکرد سیستم\u200cهای مصرف\u200cکننده باقی ماند یک چالش به دلیل غیرقابل دسترسی داده\u200cهای پارالی برای زبانهای کم منبع مانند بنگالی است. برای تغییر این مشکل، ما یک سیستم جمع\u200cآوری غیرقابل استفاده از گراف در تنظیم یک سند برای سند متن بنگالی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که فقط یک قسمتی از سخنرانی (POS) و یک مدل پیش آموزش زبانی که روی متن بنگالی آموزش داده شده نیاز دارد. ما همچنین یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای انسان را با جفت\u200cهای جمع\u200cآوری سند برای ارزیابی مدل abstractive ما و برای مقایسه کردن سیستم\u200cهای جمع\u200cآوری آینده\u200cی زبان بنگالی پشتیبانی می\u200cکنیم. ما آزمایش\u200cهای روی این مجموعه داده\u200cها را انجام می\u200cدهیم و سیستم\u200cمان را با چند سیستم\u200cهای جمع\u200cآوری استثناء غیرقابل استثناء مقایسه می\u200cکنیم. مدل جمع کردن غیرقابل تحریک ما از خطوط پایین\u200cها بیرون می\u200cرود بدون اینکه به هیچ جمع\u200cآوری\u200cای که به انسان\u200cها نشان داده شده\u200cاند نشان داده شود.', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa muhtasari wa kidini unategemea mkusanyiko mkubwa wa wanandoa wa muhtasari. Hata hivyo, utendaji wa mfumo wa kujitegemea bado unaendelea kuwa changamoto kutokana na kutokuwepo kwa taarifa zinazofanana kwa lugha ndogo kama vile Bengali. Ili kushinda tatizo hili, tunapendekeza mfumo wa ufuatiliaji usio na picha usiohifadhiwa kwa ajili ya nyaraka moja kwa moja nchini Bengali, ambalo linahitaji tu alama ya kujieleza (POS) na modeli ya lugha iliyoendeshwa kabla ya kufundishwa kwenye maandishi ya Bengali. Pia tunatoa taarifa za kibinadamu zenye ndoa za muhtasari wa nyaraka ili kutathmini mifano yetu ya kujitegemea na kuunga mkono kulinganisha na mfumo wa muhtasari wa lugha ya Bengali. Tunafanya majaribio katika seti hii ya taarifa na kuunganisha mfumo wetu na mfumo wa muhtasari wa kutosha usioeleweka vizuri. Mfano wetu wa muhtasari usiokuwa na uhakika usio na maanani unaonyesha misingi ya msingi bila kuelewa kwenye muhtasari wowote wa maoni yanayohusishwa na binadamu.', 'sq': 'Sistemet abstraktive të përmbledhjes përgjithësisht mbështeten në koleksione të mëdha të çifteve të përmbledhjes së dokumenteve. Megjithatë, performanca e sistemeve abstraktive mbetet një sfidë për shkak të mosdisponueshmërisë së të dhënave paralele për gjuhët me burime të ulta si Bengali. Për të kapërcyer këtë problem, ne propozojmë një sistem abstrakt të përmbledhur të bazuar në grafik në përcaktimin e një dokumenti të vetëm për dokumentet teksti bengaleze, i cili kërkon vetëm një etiketë pjesë-të-fjalës (POS) dhe një model gjuhësh të stërvitur para-stërvitur në tekstet bengaleze. Ne gjithashtu ofrojmë një set të dhënash të anotuar nga njerëzit me çifte dokumenti-përmbledhje për të vlerësuar modelin tonë abstraktiv dhe për të mbështetur krahasimin e sistemeve abstraktive të përmbledhjes së ardhshme të gjuhës bengale. Ne kryejmë eksperimente në këtë grup të dhënash dhe krahasojmë sistemin tonë me disa sisteme të përcaktuara të jashtëzakonshme të përmbledhura. Our unsupervised abstractive summarization model outperforms the baselines without being exposed to any human-annotated reference summaries.', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር ነገር ግን የባንጋሊ ብናይነት ቋንቋዎች በሚያይዘው አካላዊ ዳታ የጎደለው የባንጋሊ ቋንቋዎች ላይ ባለው ጥላቻ ነው፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለማሸንፍ፣ ለባንጋሊ ጽሑፎች ማሰነጃዎችን በተለየ ብሔራዊ አካባቢ አካባቢ ሥርዓት ውስጥ ያልጠበቀ የግልጽ አቋራጭ ስርዓት ማቀናጃ እና በቦንጋሊ ጽሑፎች ላይ የተማረ የፊተኛ ቋንቋ ሞዴል ብቻ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ እና የሰው አካባቢ አካባቢ ዓይነታችንን ማረጋገጥ እና የባንጋሊ ቋንቋ አካባቢ ማሳሰል ስርዓቶችን ለመስተካከል እናደርጋለን፡፡ የዚህን ዳታ ሰርቨሮች ፈተናዎችን እናደርጋለን ሲስተኛችንንም በተከታተለ ብዙዎች ያልተጠበቅ ውጤት አቁማጭ ስርዓት እናስተያየናለን፡፡ Our unsupervised abstractive summarization model outperforms the baselines without being exposed to any human-annotated reference summaries.', 'tr': 'Abstraktiw jeminatlamak sistemleri döwletlere görkezilýän sened toplamynda ynanýarlar. Ýöne abstraktiw sistemalaryň eserleşmesi Bengali ýa ýaly ýokary çeşme diller üçin parallel maglumatlaryň tapylmadygyna sebäbi kynçylyk ýok. Bu mesele üstine çykmak üçin, Bengali ň metin senediň ýeke-sened düzümlerinde grafik daýanýan abstraktiw jemgyýetleme sistemini teklif edip, diňe söz-gürrüň (POS) tägleri we Bengaliň metinlerinde öňünden bilinmeli dil nusgasyna gerek. Biz hem insan täze hasaplanýan veri setirini abstraktiw nusgasymyzy deňlemek üçin hasaplanýan we gelejekde abstraktiw hasaplanjak sistemlerini gollaşdyrmak üçin bir teklip edýäris. Biz bu data setinde deneyler çykýar we sistemimizi birnäçe gowy döredilmiş, gaýd edilmedik ekstra jemgyýet sistemleri bilen karşılaştyrýarys. Biziň gaýd edilmedik abstraktiw hilli hasaplanjak nusgasymyz beýleki hatlary daşary çykar.', 'bn': 'সাধারণত ডকুমেন্ট- সার্মির জোড়ার বিশাল সংগ্রহের উপর নির্ভর করে। তবে বাংলাদেশের মত কম সম্পদ ভাষার প্যারালেল ডাটা পাওয়ার কারণে অক্রিয় সিস্টেমের প্রদর্শনের চ্যালেঞ্জ এখনো একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ। এই সমস্যাকে জয়ী করার জন্য আমরা একটি গ্রাফ-ভিত্তিক অরক্ষণশীল সংক্রান্ত সিস্টেম প্রস্তাব করি বাংলালি টেক্সটে প্রশিক্ষিত একটি অংশ-অফ-ভাষা (পোএস) ট্যাগার এবং পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষণিত ভা এছাড়াও আমরা একটি মানুষ-বিরক্তিকর তথ্য সংক্ষেপ প্রদান করি যার মধ্যে নথিপত্র-সামার্কির জোড়া দিয়ে আমাদের নিষ্ক্রিয় মডেল মূল্য দেয়া এবং ভবিষ্যত আমরা এই ডাটাসেটে পরীক্ষা করি এবং আমাদের সিস্টেমের সাথে বেশ কয়েকটি ভালো সংরক্ষণের সাথে তুলনা করি। আমাদের অসংরক্ষিত অস্বীকৃতিক সংক্রান্ত মডেল মানুষের কোন বিরক্তিকর সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপের সাথে প্রকাশ করা ছাড়াই মানুষে', 'bs': 'Abstraktivni sažetak sustava se općenito oslanja na velike kolekcije sažetnih par dokumenta. Međutim, učinkovitost abstraktivnih sustava ostaje izazov zbog nepostupnosti paralelnih podataka za jezike niskih resursa poput Bengalija. Za prevladanje ovog problem a predlažemo sistem nepotrebnog abstraktivnog sažetka na grafiku u postavljanju jednakog dokumenta za tekstske dokumente Bengalija, koji zahtijeva samo merker dijela govora (POS) i predobučeni jezički model obučen na tekstima Bengalija. Također pružamo i ljudskom spoju podataka sa sažetnim parovima za procjenu našeg abstraktivnog model a i podržavanje usporedbe budućih abstraktivnih sustava sažetanja Bengalskog jezika. Provodimo eksperimente na ovom setu podataka i uspoređujemo naš sistem sa nekoliko dobro uspostavljenih ekstraktivnih sustava za sažetak. Naš neodređeni model abstraktivne sažetke iznosi osnovne linije bez izloženosti bilo kojim sažetkama referenta na ljudima.', 'ca': 'Els sistemes de resum abstractiu es basan generalment en grans col·leccions de parells de resum de documents. Però el rendiment dels sistemes abstractius encara és un repte degut a la falta de disponibilitat de dades paralleles per llengües amb baix recursos com el bengalí. Per superar aquest problem a, proposem un sistema de resume abstractiu no supervisionat basat en gràfics en un únic document per a documents de text bengalès, que només necessita un etiquetador Part-Of-Speech (POS) i un model de llenguatge pré-entrenat entrenat en textos bengalès. També proporcionem un conjunt de dades anotats per humans amb parelles de resum de documents per avaluar el nostre model abstractiu i per sostenir la comparació de futurs sistemes abstractius de resum del llenguatge bengalí. Fem experiments en aquest conjunt de dades i comparem el nostre sistema amb diversos sistemes de resume extractiu no supervisat. El nostre model de resum abstracte sense supervisió supera les línies de base sense ser exposat a qualsevol resum de referència anotat per humans.', 'af': "Abstraktiewe opsomming stelsels generelik vertel op groot versameling van dokument- opsomming paar. Maar die prestasie van abstraktiewe stelsels bly 'n uitdrukking vanweë die onbeskikbaarheid van die parallele data vir lae hulpbron tale soos Bengali. Om hierdie probleem te oorwin, voorstel ons 'n graaf-gebaseerde onverondersteunde abstraktiewe opsomming stelsel in die enkel- dokument instelling vir Bengali teksdokumente, wat slegs 'n Deel- van- Spraak (POS) merker en 'n vooraf- opgevoerde taal model wat op Bengali teks geleer is. Ons verskaf ook 'n menslike-notateerde datastel met dokument-opsomming paar om ons abstraktiewe model te evalueer en om die vergelyking van toekomstige abstraktiewe opsomming stelsels van die Bengali taal te ondersteun. Ons uitvoer eksperimente op hierdie datastel en vergelyk ons stelsel met verskeie goed gestalte onondersteunde ekstraktiewe opsomming stelsels. Ons onverondersteunde abstraktiewe opsomming model uitvoer die basis lyne sonder dat hulle aan enige mens-notateerde verwysing opsommings uitgevoer word.", 'hy': 'Աբստրակտիվ համառոտագրման համակարգերը սովորաբար հիմնված են փաստաթղթերի համառոտագրման զույգերի մեծ հավաքածուների վրա: Այնուամենայնիվ, վերացրատիվ համակարգերի արտադրողությունը դեռևս մարտահրավեր է, քանի որ ցածր ռեսուրսներ ունեցող լեզուների, ինչպիսիք են Բենգալացիները, զուգահեռ տվյալների բացակայությունը: Այս խնդիրը հաղթահարելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք գծագրի վրա հիմնված ոչ վերահսկված վերացրական համառոտագրական համակարգ Բենգալացի տեքստի փաստաթղթերի մեկ փաստաթղթի ընթացքում, որը պահանջում է միայն խոսքի մասի (POS) նշանակիչ և նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդել, որը պատրաստված է Բենգալացի տե Մենք նաև տրամադրում ենք մարդկային գրված տվյալների համակարգ փաստաթղթերի համառոտագրման զույգերի հետ, որպեսզի գնահատենք մեր վերացրատիվ մոդելը և աջակցենք Բենգալացի լեզվի ապագա վերացրատիվ համառոտագրման համակարգերի համեմատությունը: Մենք փորձեր ենք կատարում այս տվյալների համակարգի վրա և համեմատում ենք մեր համակարգը մի քանի լավ հաստատված անվերահսկված հանրային համառոտագրման համակարգերի հետ: Մեր անվերահսկված վերացական համառոտագրման մոդելը գերազանցում է հիմնական գծերը առանց որևէ մարդկային նկարագրված հաղորդակցման համառոտագրության:', 'et': 'Kokkuvõtlikud kokkuvõtlussüsteemid tuginevad üldiselt dokumentide ja kokkuvõtlike paaride suurtele kogumitele. Abstraktsete süsteemide jõudlus on siiski endiselt väljakutseks, kuna paralleelsed andmed puuduvad vähese ressursiga keelte kohta, nagu bengali keel. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks pakume välja graafikapõhise järelevalveta abstraktse kokkuvõtte süsteemi bengali tekstidokumentide ühedokumendi seadistuses, mis nõuab ainult kõneosa (POS) sildistajat ja bengali tekstidele koolitatud eelõpetatud keelemudelit. Samuti pakume inimese-annoteeritud andmekogumit dokumendi-kokkuvõtte paaridega, et hinnata meie abstraktset mudelit ja toetada bengali keele tulevaste abstraktsete kokkuvõtlussüsteemide võrdlemist. Me teeme selle andmekogumiga katseid ja võrdleme oma süsteemi mitmete väljakujunenud järelevalveta ekstraheerimissüsteemidega. Meie järelevalveta abstraktse kokkuvõtlusmudeli tulemused ületavad lähtejooni, ilma et nad puutuks kokku inimese märgitud viitekokkuvõtetega.', 'fi': 'Tiivistelmﾃ､tiivistelmﾃ､jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､t perustuvat yleensﾃ､ suuriin asiakirjojen ja tiivistelmﾃ､parien kokoelmiin. Abstraktiivisten jﾃ､rjestelmien suorituskyky on kuitenkin edelleen haaste, koska rinnakkaistietoja ei ole saatavilla bengalin kaltaisista vﾃ､hﾃ､varaisista kielistﾃ､. Tﾃ､mﾃ､n ongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme bengalilaisten tekstiasiakirjojen yhden asiakirjan asetukseen perustuvaa, valvomatonta abstraktiivista yhteenvetojﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ﾃ､, joka vaatii vain POS-taggerin ja bengalinkielisiin teksteihin koulutetun kielimallin. Tarjoamme myﾃｶs ihmisannotoidun aineiston dokumentti-tiivistelmﾃ､pareilla abstraktiivisen mallimme arvioimiseksi ja bengalin kielen tulevien abstraktiivisten tiivistelmﾃ､jﾃ､rjestelmien vertailun tueksi. Teemme kokeita tﾃ､llﾃ､ aineistolla ja vertaamme jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ﾃ､mme useisiin vakiintuneisiin, valvomattomiin uuttamisjﾃ､rjestelmiin. Valvontaton abstrakti yhteenvetomallimme suoriutuu perusarvoja paremmin ilman, ettﾃ､ se altistuu ihmisen tekemille viiteyhteenvedoille.', 'az': 'Abstraktiv qurğulama sistemləri genellikle dökümət-qurğulama çiftlərinin böyük koleksiyonlarına təvəkkül edir. Halbuki, abstraktiv sistemlərin performansı Bengali kimi düşük ressurs dillərinin paralel məlumatların faydalanmasına görə çətindir. Bu problemi üstün etmək üçün, Bengali metin belələri üçün yalnız bir parça dil etiketçisi və Bengali metinlərdə təhsil edilmiş öyrənməmiş dil model in in grafik tabanlı abstraktiv təhsil sistemini təklif edirik. Biz həmçinin bizim abstraktiv modelimizi değerləşdirmək və Bengali dilinin gələcək abstraktiv qurğulama sistemlərinin qarşılaşdırmasını dəstəklənmək üçün insan bildirilmiş verilən qurğuları ilə təmin edirik. Biz bu verilənlər qutusunda eksperimentlər etdik və sistemimizi çoxlu yaxşı qurulmuş ekstraktif qurğulama sistemləri ilə qarşılaşdırırıq. Bizim müəyyən edilməmiş abstraktiv qurğulama modeliyimiz insan-annotated referans qurğularına göstərilmədən əsas çətinləri üstün edir.', 'cs': 'Abstrakční souhrnné systémy obecně spoléhají na velké sbírky párů dokumentů-souhrnných. Výkon abstraktivních systémů však zůstává výzvou vzhledem k nedostupnosti paralelních dat pro jazyky s nízkými zdroji, jako je bengálština. Abychom tento problém překonali, navrhujeme grafový systém abstraktního shrnutí bez dohledu v nastavení jednoho dokumentu pro bengálské textové dokumenty, který vyžaduje pouze tagger části řeči (POS) a předškolený jazykový model trénovaný na bengálských textech. Dále poskytujeme člověkem anotovaný datový soubor s páry dokumentů-souhrnných pro zhodnocení našeho abstraktivního modelu a pro podporu srovnání budoucích abstraktivních souhrnných systémů bengálského jazyka. Na tomto datovém souboru provádíme experimenty a porovnáváme náš systém s několika dobře zavedenými extrakčními souhrnnými systémy bez dohledu. Náš bez dozoru abstraktivní souhrnný model předčí základní linie, aniž by byl vystaven žádným lidským anotovaným referenčním shrnutím.', 'jv': 'Samsul Nanging, nggawe sistem sing paling apakno dumadhi kapan kawit dadi sing perusahaan karo nganggep kuwi mau, dadi sing perusahaan kanggo langgambar sing kakang Bengal kanggo nggawe boton iki, kita supoyo nggawe sistem di resumen apa-basa intake sing gawe nguasai perusahaan seneng nggawe tokkum BenGali, sing kudune nggawe kota Perintah-ingkang (po S) jenengan langkung model sing wis ana luwih dumaten Bengal texti. Monday Monday Awakdhéwé ora nggawe perusahaan resumen dumadhi sing gak bener', 'he': 'מערכות מסכם אסטרקטיביות סומכות בדרך כלל על אוסף גדול של זוגות מסמכים-מסמכים. עם זאת, ההופעה של מערכות אוסטרקטיביות נשארת אתגר בגלל הלא זמינות של המידע המקביל לשפות עם משאבים נמוכים כמו בנגלי. To overcome this problem, we propose a graph-based unsupervised abstractive summarization system in the single-document setting for Bengali text documents, which requires only a Part-Of-Speech (POS) tagger and a pre-trained language model trained on Bengali texts.  אנחנו גם מספקים קבוצת מידע אנושית עם זוגות מסמכים-סכם כדי להעריך את המודל המתוקף שלנו ולתמוך בהשוואה של מערכות הסכם המתוקפים העתידיות של השפה הבנגלית. אנו מבצעים ניסויים על קבוצת המידע הזו ולהשוות את מערכתנו עם מספר מערכות מסדרות אספורטיביות לא מוצגות היטב. מודל המסכם המסוכן שלנו ללא השגחה מעליף את השורות הבסיסיות בלי להיות חשוף לכל סדרות התייחסות אנושיות.', 'bo': 'རྨས་གཞུང་གི་བསྡུས་བརྗོད་བྱེད་སྟངས་ལ་ཡིག་ཆའི་ཆ་ཤས་ཆེ་བའི་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུར་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། མ་ཤེས་པའི་ལག་ལེན་གྱི་ལས་འགན་སྐྱོང་ནུས་པ་བློ་གཏོང་ན་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་བློ་གཏོང་ལས་ཉུང་བའི་ཆ་ To overcome this problem, we propose a graph-based unsupervised abstractive summarization system in the single-document setting for Bengali text documents, which requires only a Part-Of-Speech (POS) tagger and a pre-trained language model trained on Bengali texts. ང་ཚོས་མི་རྣམས་ལ་གསལ་བཀོད་པའི་གནད་དོན་ཡིག་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ཡིག་ཆའི་བསྡུར་རིམ་གྱི་མ་དཔེ་ལ། ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཚུལ་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་མེད་པའི་འཕགས་རིས་མཐོང་བའི་མཛོད་ཁང་གི་མཐོང་སྣང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དེ་ནི་', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis A lokacin da, mafarin tsarin da aka kange shi yana mai musamma, amma bã za'a iya sãmun data da za'a daidaita wa harshen-wuri kamar Bangali. To, dõmin ya rinjãye wannan muammãni, Munã buɗe wani tsari na grafi wanda ba'a tsare shi ba na da tsari na takardar takardar aiki na ɗabi'a wa Bangali, wanda yana bukãtar da shi kawai wani abu na-yi-magana (PSS) da wani misalin harshe wanda aka yi wa lõkaci na rubutun Bangali. Tuna samar da wani danne-da aka sanar da mutum wanda yana da takardar-sami-nau'in don su evaluate misalinmu na kanrakati, kuma don mu ƙarfafa misalin sami'in da ake samu'ar tsari na'urar ƙarƙashin bangali. Kana tafiyar jarrabai kan wannan tsari na danganta kuma mu sami tsarin mu da wasu masu tsari da ba'a tsare shi ba. Salon bakin da ba'a tsare ba ta sami bakin, ba za'a buɗe shi ba ga wani ƙararin fassarar mutane da ba'a zartar da shi ba.", 'sk': 'Sistemi abstraktivnega povzetka se običajno zanašajo na velike zbirke parov dokumentov in povzetkov. Vendar pa zmogljivost abstraktivnih sistemov ostaja izziv zaradi nedostopnosti vzporednih podatkov za jezike z nizkimi viri, kot je bengališčina. Za reševanje tega problema predlagamo grafično-nadzorovan sistem abstraktivnega povzemanja v nastavitvi enodokumenta za bengalske besedilne dokumente, ki zahteva samo označevalnik dela govora (POS) in vnaprej usposobljen jezikovni model, usposobljen za bengalske besedila. Zagotavljamo tudi človeško označen nabor podatkov s parom dokumentov-povzetkov za oceno našega abstraktivnega modela in podporo primerjavi prihodnjih sistemov abstraktivnega povzetka bengalskega jezika. Izvajamo poskuse na tem naboru podatkov in primerjamo naš sistem z več dobro uveljavljenimi, nenadzorovanimi ekstraktivnimi sistemi za povzetek. Naš nenadzorovan abstraktivni model povzetka presega osnovne črte, ne da bi bil izpostavljen nobenim referenčnim povzetkom s človeškimi oznakami.'}
{'en': 'On the Computational Modelling of Michif Verbal Morphology', 'ar': 'في النمذجة الحاسوبية لمورفولوجيا ميشيف اللفظية', 'pt': 'Sobre a Modelagem Computacional da Morfologia Verbal de Michif', 'fr': 'Sur la modélisation informatique de la morphologie verbale en michif', 'es': 'Sobre el modelado computacional de la morfología verbal de Michif', 'ja': 'Michif Verbal Morphologyの計算モデリングについて', 'zh': '其Michif动词形态学之数建模', 'ru': 'О вычислительном моделировании вербальной морфологии Мишифа', 'hi': 'Michif मौखिक आकृति विज्ञान के कम्प्यूटेशनल मॉडलिंग पर', 'ga': 'Ar Shamhaltú Ríomhaireachtúil Mhoirfeolaíocht Bhriathartha Michif', 'ka': 'Michif Verbal Morphology', 'el': 'Σχετικά με την υπολογιστική μοντελοποίηση της προφορικής μορφολογίας του Μίσιφ', 'lt': 'Apie Michifo žodinės morfologijos kompiuterinį modeliavimą', 'kk': 'Мичиф Вербал морфологиясының компьютерлік модель үшін', 'hu': 'Michif verbális morfológia számítástechnikai modellezéséről', 'it': 'Sulla Modellazione Computazionale della Morfologia Verbale di Michif', 'ms': 'Pada Modelan Komputasi Morfologi Perkataan Michif', 'ml': 'On the Computational Modelling of Michif Verbal Morphology', 'mt': 'Dwar il-Mudellar Komputattiv tal-Morfoloġija Verbali Michif', 'mn': 'Мичиф Вербал Морфологийн компьютерийн загварын тухай', 'no': 'På datamodellen av Michif Verbal Morphology', 'pl': 'O modelowaniu obliczeniowym morfologii werbalnej Michifa', 'ro': 'Despre modelarea computațională a Morfologiei Verbale Michif', 'sr': 'Na računalnom modelu Michif Verbal Morfologije', 'si': 'මයිචිෆ් වෙර්බල් මෝර්ෆෝලෝජිකයේ පරිගණික මොඩෙල්ලින් ගැන', 'so': 'On the Computational Modelling of Michif Verbal Morphology', 'mk': 'On the Computational Modelling of Michif Verbal Morphology', 'ur': 'Michif Verbal Morphology کی کمپیوٹریشن مدل پر', 'ta': 'மைக்கிஃப் வெர்பால் மார்போலிகலியின் கணிப்பாக மாதிரிதலில்', 'sv': 'Om beräkningsmodellering av Michifs verbala morfologi', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'On the vi tính Modelling of Michif Verbil Morphology', 'nl': 'Over de computermodellering van Michif Verbale Morfologie', 'da': 'Om beregningsmodellering af Michif Verbal Morphology', 'bg': 'За изчислителната моделиране на устната морфология на Михиф', 'hr': 'Na računalnom modelu Michif Verbal Morphologije', 'ko': 'Michif 언어 형태학의 계산 모델', 'sw': 'Kuhusu Uumbuzi wa Michif Verbal Morphology', 'de': 'Zur rechnerischen Modellierung der Michif Verbal Morphologie', 'id': 'Dalam Modeling Komputasi Morfologi Michif Verbal', 'af': 'Op die Rekenaar Modelling van Michif Verbal Morphology', 'am': 'ማክሊፍ Verbal Morphology', 'tr': 'Michif Verbal Morphologiýasynda Bilgisayar Modelinde', 'hy': 'On the Computational Modelling of Michif Verbal Morphology', 'bn': 'On the Computational Modelling of Michif Verbal Morphology', 'az': "Michif Verbal Morphology'nın Bilgisayar Modelində", 'sq': 'Në modelimin kompjuterik të morfologjisë së Michif Verbal', 'ca': 'En el Modell Computacional de Morfologia Verbal Michif', 'et': 'Michifi verbaalse morfoloogia arvutusliku modelleerimise kohta', 'fa': 'در مورد مدل کامپیوتری مورفولوژی میکیف وربال', 'cs': 'O výpočetním modelování Michífa verbální morfologie', 'bs': 'Na računalnom modelu Michif Verbal Morphologije', 'fi': 'Michif Verbal Morfologian laskennallinen mallinnus', 'jv': 'Nang modèlan Kompjuter', 'he': 'על מודל מחשב של מורפולוגיה מישיף ורבולית', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'O računalniškem modeliranju Michifove verbalne morfologije', 'bo': 'Michif Verbal Morphology ་གྱི་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་བཟོས་སྟེ།'}
{'en': 'This paper presents a finite-state computational model of the verbal morphology of Michif. Michif, the official language of the Mtis peoples, is a uniquely mixed language with Algonquian and French origins. It is spoken across the Mtis homelands in what is now called Canada and the United States, but it is highly endangered with less than 100 speakers. The verbal morphology is remarkably complex, as the already polysynthetic Algonquian patterns are combined with French elements and unique morpho-phonological interactions. The model presented in this paper, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF handles this complexity by using a series of composed finite-state transducers to model the concatenative morphology and phonological rule alternations that are unique to Michif. Such a rule-based approach is necessary as there is insufficient language data for an approach that uses machine learning. A language model such as LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF furthers the goals of Indigenous computational linguistics in Canada while also supporting the creation of tools for documentation, education, and revitalization that are desired by the Mtis community.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta un modelo computacional de estados finitos de la morfología verbal de Michif. El michif, el idioma oficial de los pueblos mëtis, es un idioma mixto único con orígenes algonquinos y franceses. Se habla en las tierras natales de los Mëtis en lo que ahora se llama Canadá y los Estados Unidos, pero está en gran peligro de extinción con menos de 100 hablantes. La morfología verbal es notablemente compleja, ya que los patrones algonquinos ya polisintéticos se combinan con elementos franceses e interacciones morfofonológicas únicas. El modelo presentado en este artículo, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF, maneja esta complejidad mediante el uso de una serie de estados finitos compuestos transductores para modelar la morfología concatenativa y las alternancias de reglas fonológicas que son exclusivas de Michif. Este enfoque basado en reglas es necesario, ya que no hay suficientes datos de idioma para un enfoque que utilice el aprendizaje automático. Un modelo lingüístico como LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF promueve los objetivos de la lingüística computacional indígena en Canadá y, al mismo tiempo, apoya la creación de herramientas de documentación, educación y revitalización deseadas por la comunidad mëtis.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة نموذجًا حسابيًا للحالة المحدودة للصرف اللفظي لميشيف. Michif ، اللغة الرسمية لشعوب Mëtis ، هي لغة مختلطة بشكل فريد مع أصول ألغونكيان والفرنسية. يتم التحدث بها عبر أوطان Mëtis في ما يسمى الآن كندا والولايات المتحدة ، لكنها معرضة بشدة للخطر مع أقل من 100 متحدث. يعتبر التشكل اللفظي معقدًا بشكل ملحوظ ، حيث يتم دمج أنماط ألغونكويان متعددة التركيبات بالفعل مع عناصر فرنسية وتفاعلات مورفو صوتية فريدة. النموذج المقدم في هذه الورقة ، LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF يتعامل مع هذا التعقيد باستخدام سلسلة من العناصر المحدودة المكونة محولات الطاقة لنمذجة التشكل التسلسلي وتناوب القواعد الصوتية الفريدة لميشيف. يعد هذا النهج القائم على القواعد ضروريًا نظرًا لعدم وجود بيانات لغة كافية لنهج يستخدم التعلم الآلي. نموذج لغوي مثل LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF يعزز أهداف اللغويات الحسابية الأصلية في كندا بينما يدعم أيضًا إنشاء أدوات للتوثيق والتعليم والتنشيط التي يرغب فيها مجتمع Mëtis.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta um modelo computacional de estado finito da morfologia verbal de Michif. Michif, a língua oficial dos povos Mëtis, é uma língua exclusivamente mista com origens algonquinas e francesas. É falado em toda a terra natal Mëtis no que agora é chamado de Canadá e Estados Unidos, mas está altamente ameaçado com menos de 100 falantes. A morfologia verbal é notavelmente complexa, pois os padrões algonquianos já polissintéticos são combinados com elementos franceses e interações morfofonológicas únicas. transdutores de estado para modelar a morfologia concatenativa e as alternâncias de regras fonológicas que são exclusivas de Michif. Essa abordagem baseada em regras é necessária, pois não há dados de linguagem suficientes para uma abordagem que usa aprendizado de máquina. Um modelo de linguagem como LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF promove os objetivos da linguística computacional indígena no Canadá, além de apoiar a criação de ferramentas para documentação, educação e revitalização desejadas pela comunidade Mëtis.', 'fr': "Cet article présente un modèle informatique à états finis de la morphologie verbale du michif. Le michif, langue officielle des peuples métis, est une langue mixte unique d'origine algonquienne et française. Il est parlé dans les terres natales métisses de ce que l'on appelle aujourd'hui le Canada et les États-Unis, mais il est très menacé avec moins de 100 locuteurs. La morphologie verbale est remarquablement complexe, car les motifs algonquiens déjà polysynthétiques sont combinés avec des éléments français et des interactions morpho-phonologiques uniques. Le modèle présenté dans cet article, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF gère cette complexité en utilisant une série d'états finis composés des transducteurs pour modéliser la morphologie concaténative et les alternances de règles phonologiques propres au michif. Une telle approche basée sur des règles est nécessaire car les données linguistiques sont insuffisantes pour une approche qui utilise l'apprentissage automatique. Un modèle de langage tel que LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF contribue aux objectifs de la linguistique computationnelle autochtone au Canada tout en soutenant la création d'outils de documentation, d'éducation et de revitalisation souhaités par la communauté métisse.", 'hi': 'यह पेपर मिचिफ के मौखिक आकृति विज्ञान का एक परिमित-राज्य कम्प्यूटेशनल मॉडल प्रस्तुत करता है। Michif, Métis लोगों की आधिकारिक भाषा, Algonquian और फ्रांसीसी मूल के साथ एक विशिष्ट रूप से मिश्रित भाषा है। यह मीटिस होमलैंड्स में बोली जाती है जिसे अब कनाडा और संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका कहा जाता है, लेकिन यह 100 से कम वक्ताओं के साथ अत्यधिक लुप्तप्राय है। मौखिक आकृति विज्ञान उल्लेखनीय रूप से जटिल है, क्योंकि पहले से ही पॉलीसिंथेटिक एल्गोनक्वियन पैटर्न फ्रांसीसी तत्वों और अद्वितीय मोर्फो-ध्वन्यात्मक इंटरैक्शन के साथ संयुक्त हैं। इस पेपर में प्रस्तुत मॉडल, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF इस जटिलता को संकुचित आकृति विज्ञान और ध्वन्यात्मक नियम alternations कि Michif के लिए अद्वितीय हैं मॉडल करने के लिए परिमित-राज्य ट्रांसड्यूसर की एक श्रृंखला का उपयोग करके संभालता है। इस तरह के नियम-आधारित दृष्टिकोण आवश्यक है क्योंकि मशीन लर्निंग का उपयोग करने वाले दृष्टिकोण के लिए अपर्याप्त भाषा डेटा है। एक भाषा मॉडल जैसे LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF कनाडा में स्वदेशी कम्प्यूटेशनल भाषाविज्ञान के लक्ष्यों को आगे बढ़ाता है, जबकि प्रलेखन, शिक्षा और पुनरुद्धार के लिए उपकरणों के निर्माण का भी समर्थन करता है जो Métis समुदाय द्वारा वांछित हैं।', 'ja': 'ミシフの言語形態論の有限状態計算モデルを提示した。 ミシフ語はモティ人の公用語であり、アルゴンキン語とフランス語の起源を持つ固有の混合言語です。 現在カナダやアメリカ合衆国と呼ばれているモティ人の故郷全体で話されていますが、話者数は100人未満と非常に絶滅の危機に瀕しています。 すでに多合成されたアルゴンキン語族のパターンは、フランス語の要素と固有の形態音声学的相互作用と組み合わされているため、言語形態学は非常に複雑である。この論文で提示されたモデル、LI動詞KAA - OOSHITAHK DI Michifは、一連の構成された有限状態トランスデューサを使用して、Michifに固有の連結形態学と音声学的ルールの交替をモデル化することによって、この複雑さを処理する。 このようなルールベースのアプローチは、機械学習を使用するアプローチには不十分な言語データがあるため、必要である。 LI動詞KAA - OOSHITAHK DI Michifなどの言語モデルは、カナダの先住民計算言語学の目標をさらに推進すると同時に、Mëtisコミュニティが望む文書化、教育、活性化のためのツールの作成を支援します。', 'zh': '本文Michif动词形之有限。 Michif者,Mëtis人之官方语言,特出阿尔冈昆语法语。 今谓之加拿大、美国Mëtis家用之,然其高濒危,唯不及100人。 动词形非常复杂者,以多合Algonquian与元素独见 - 语音相得也。 本文所设模形LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF因列组之有限换能器以拟Michif独有连续形态学语音之法,以处其复杂性。 此其法必矣,其于用机器学也,言语不足也。 若LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF之言,推加拿大土著计语言学,兼赞创Mëtis社区之文档,教振器械。', 'ru': 'В данной работе представлена конечно-стационарная вычислительная модель вербальной морфологии Мичифа. Мичиф, официальный язык народов метисов, является уникальным языком со смешанным алгонкским и французским происхождением. На нем говорят на всей родине метисов в так называемых Канаде и Соединенных Штатах, но он находится под угрозой исчезновения, и в нем говорят менее 100 человек. Словесная морфология удивительно сложна, поскольку уже полисинтетические алгонкские паттерны сочетаются с французскими элементами и уникальными морфо-фонологическими взаимодействиями. Модель, представленная в этой статье, ГЛАГОЛ LI KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF обрабатывает эту сложность, используя серию составленных конечных датчиков для моделирования конкатенативной морфологии и чередования фонологических правил, которые уникальны для Michif. Такой основанный на правилах подход необходим, поскольку языковых данных недостаточно для подхода, в котором используется машинное обучение. Языковая модель, такая как ГЛАГОЛ LI KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF, способствует достижению целей компьютерной лингвистики коренных народов в Канаде, а также поддерживает создание инструментов для документирования, образования и возрождения, которые желательны для сообщества метисов.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo múnla ríomhaireachtúil staid chríochnaithe i láthair de mhoirfeolaíocht bhriathartha Michif. Is teanga uathúil mheasctha í Michif, teanga oifigiúil na bpobal Mëtis, a bhfuil bunús Algonquian agus Fraincis aici. Labhraítear í ar fud thír dhúchais Mëtis i gCeanada agus sna Stáit Aontaithe anois, ach tá sé i mbaol mór le níos lú ná 100 cainteoir. Tá an mhoirfeolaíocht bhriathartha thar a bheith casta, toisc go bhfuil na patrúin Algonquian polaisintéiseach comhcheangailte cheana féin le heilimintí Fraincise agus le hidirghníomhaíochtaí moirfó-fhóineolaíochta uathúla. An tsamhail a chuirtear i láthair sa pháipéar seo, láimhseálann LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF an chastacht seo trí úsáid a bhaint as sraith críochta comhdhéanta-. trasducers luaigh chun an mhoirfeolaíocht chomhchuingeach agus na malartaithe rialacha fóineolaíochta atá uathúil do Michif a shamhaltú. Tá gá lena leithéid de chur chuige bunaithe ar rialacha toisc nach bhfuil dóthain sonraí teanga ann do chur chuige a úsáideann meaisínfhoghlaim. Cuireann múnla teanga ar nós LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF chun cinn spriocanna na ríomhtheangeolaíochta dúchasach i gCeanada agus ag an am céanna tacaíonn sé le huirlisí a chruthú don doiciméadú, don oideachas agus don athbheochan atá ag teastáil ón bpobal Mëtis.', 'ka': 'ეს დაახლობა მიქიფის გერბალური მორფოლოგიის კომპუტაციალური მოდელს დასაწყება. მიქიფი, მეტისის ადამიანების официальный ენაა, არის ერთადერთი წყვეტილი ენაა ალგონკიანიან და ფრანგური პირობით. მას მეტისის სახლის სახლის სახლის სახლის სახელში, რომელიც ახლა კანადია და ამერიკეთებული შტატები, მაგრამ ის ძალიან დარჩენა 100-ზე მეტი სიტყვებით. გერბალური მორპოლოგია უფრო კომპლექსია, რადგან მხოლოდ პოლისინტეტიკური ალგონკური მონაცემები ფრანგური ელემენტებით და სუნიკალური მორპოფონოლოგი მოდელი, რომელიც ამ დომენტში ჩვენებულია, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF ამ კომპლექციას გადაყენებს, რომელიც მიქიფის განსხვავებული კომპოტენტიური მდგომარების სერიის გამოყენებით კომპოტენტიური მორგულოლოგი ასეთი წესების დამატებული პროგრამა უნდა იყოს, რადგან არსებობს მსგავსი ენის მონაცემების მონაცემები, რომელიც მაქსინური სწავლების გამოყენებ ენის მოდელი, როგორც LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF, კანადიაში ინდიგენური კომპუტეციალური ლინგუტისტიკის მიზეზების მიზეზების შემდეგ კომპუტეციალური ლინგუტისტიკის შექმნა, განათლების და რევიტალიზაციის შექმნა, რო', 'hu': 'A tanulmány bemutatja Michif verbális morfológiájának véges állapotú számítási modelljét. A Michif, a Metis népek hivatalos nyelve, egyedülállóan vegyes nyelv algonquiai és francia eredetű. Az Egyesült Államokban és Kanadában a Metis hazájában beszélik, de nagyon veszélyeztetett, kevesebb mint 100 beszélővel. A verbális morfológia rendkívül összetett, mivel a már poliszintetikus algonquiai minták francia elemekkel és egyedi morfo-fonológiai kölcsönhatásokkal kombinálódnak. A dolgozatban bemutatott LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF modell ezt a komplexitást egy sor komponált véges állapotú átalakító segítségével kezeli a Michif egyedülálló konatenatív morfológiájának és fonológiai szabályváltásainak modellezésére. Egy ilyen szabályokon alapuló megközelítésre van szükség, mivel a gépi tanulást alkalmazó megközelítéshez elegendő nyelvi adatok állnak rendelkezésre. Egy olyan nyelvi modell, mint a LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF, elősegíti az őslakos számítógépes nyelvészet céljait Kanadában, miközben támogatja a Metis közösség által kívánt dokumentációs, oktatási és revitalizációs eszközök létrehozását is.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει ένα υπολογιστικό μοντέλο πεπερασμένης κατάστασης της λεκτικής μορφολογίας του Μιχίφ. Η Μίσιφ, η επίσημη γλώσσα των Μετών, είναι μια μοναδικά μικτή γλώσσα με αλγκονκιανή και γαλλική καταγωγή. Μιλιέται σε όλες τις πατρίδες του Μετή στον Καναδά και στις Ηνωμένες Πολιτείες, αλλά κινδυνεύει ιδιαίτερα με λιγότερο από 100 ομιλητές. Η λεκτική μορφολογία είναι εξαιρετικά πολύπλοκη, καθώς τα ήδη πολυσυνθετικά αλγονκιά μοτίβα συνδυάζονται με γαλλικά στοιχεία και μοναδικές μορφοφωνολογικές αλληλεπιδράσεις. Το μοντέλο που παρουσιάζεται σε αυτή την εργασία, χειρίζεται αυτή την πολυπλοκότητα χρησιμοποιώντας μια σειρά σύνθετων μετατροπέων πεπερασμένης κατάστασης για να μοντελοποιήσει την αλληλοσυγκροτητική μορφολογία και τις εναλλαγές φωνολογικών κανόνων που είναι μοναδικές για τον Μιχίφ. Μια τέτοια προσέγγιση βάσει κανόνων είναι απαραίτητη, καθώς δεν υπάρχουν επαρκή γλωσσικά δεδομένα για μια προσέγγιση που χρησιμοποιεί μηχανική μάθηση. Ένα γλωσσικό μοντέλο όπως το προωθεί τους στόχους της αυτόχθονας υπολογιστικής γλωσσολογίας στον Καναδά ενώ παράλληλα υποστηρίζει τη δημιουργία εργαλείων τεκμηρίωσης, εκπαίδευσης και αναζωογόνησης που είναι επιθυμητά από την κοινότητα του Μετή.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta un modello computazionale a stato finito della morfologia verbale di Michif. Il michif, la lingua ufficiale dei popoli Metis, è una lingua unica mista con origini algonquiane e francesi. Si parla in tutte le nazioni dei Metis in quello che oggi viene chiamato Canada e Stati Uniti, ma è altamente minacciata con meno di 100 parlanti. La morfologia verbale è notevolmente complessa, in quanto i modelli algonquiani già polisintetici sono combinati con elementi francesi e interazioni morfo-fonologiche uniche. Il modello presentato in questo articolo, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF gestisce questa complessità utilizzando una serie di trasduttori a stato finito composti per modellare la morfologia concatenativa e le alternanze fonologiche uniche di Michif. Tale approccio basato su regole è necessario in quanto i dati linguistici sono insufficienti per un approccio che utilizza l'apprendimento automatico. Un modello linguistico come LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF promuove gli obiettivi della linguistica computazionale indigena in Canada, sostenendo anche la creazione di strumenti per la documentazione, l'educazione e la rivitalizzazione desiderati dalla comunità Metis.", 'mk': 'Овој весник претставува конфиниран модел на компјутација на вербалната морфологија на Мишиф. Мишиф, официјалниот јазик на луѓето од Метис, е единствено мешан јазик со алгонхијанско и француско потекло. Тој се зборува низ татковината на Метис во она што сега се нарекува Канада и САД, но е во голема опасност со помалку од 100 говорници. Вербалната морфологија е неверојатно комплексна, бидејќи веќе полисинтетичките алгонкиски шеми се комбинирани со француските елементи и уникатни морфофонолошки интеракции. Моделот претставен во овој весник, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF ја решава оваа комплексност со користење на серија композирани трансдукатори со крајна состојба за моделирање на конзатентативната морфологија и фонолошките алтернативи на правилата кои се уникатни за Мичиф. Таков пристап базиран на правила е неопходен бидејќи нема доволни јазички податоци за пристап кој користи машинско учење. Модел на јазик како што е LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF ги продолжува целите на Индигенската компјутативна јазика во Канада, истовремено поддржувајќи го и создавањето алатки за документација, образование и ревитализација кои се желби од заедницата Метис.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз Мичифдің вербалды морфологиясының шектелген есептеу үлгісін көрсетеді. Метис адамдарының әкімшілік тілі Мичиф - алгонкиан және французша басталып жатқан тіл. Қазір Канада және АҚШ деп аталатын Метис мекелерінде сөйлесілген, бірақ ол 100-ден аз сөйлейтінде көп қауіпсіз болады. Вербалды морфология өте жақсы комплекс, себебі алгонкиан полисинтетикалық үлгілері французша элементтермен біріктірілген және бірнеше морфофологиялық интерфейстермен біріктірілген. Бұл қағазда келтірілген үлгі LI VERB KAA- OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF бұл комплексті түрлендірушілердің бірнеше шектелген күй- жай аударғыштарды Мичифге бірнеше морфология мен фонологиялық ережелерді үлгілеу үшін қолданады. Бұл ережелердің негізінде тәртібі қажетті, өйткені машина оқыту үшін тіл деректері жеткілікті емес. LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF секілді тіл үлгісі Канададағы indigenous computational linguistics мақсаттарын көтереді, сондай-ақ Metis коммуналы қалайтын құжаттамасы, білім және қайталау құралдарын құру құралын қолдайды.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiamas Michif žodinės morfologijos skaičiavimo modelis. Michif, the official language of the Metis peoples, is a uniquely mixed language with Algonquian and French origins.  Ji kalbama visoje Metis giminėje Kanadoje ir Jungtinėse Amerikos Valstijose, tačiau jai gresia didelis pavojus mažiau nei 100 kalbėtojų. žodinė morfologija yra nepaprastai sudėtinga, nes jau polisintetiniai algonkijos modeliai derinami su prancūzų elementais ir unikaliomis morfofonologinėmis sąveikomis. Šiame dokumente pateiktame modelyje LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF sprendžia šį sudėtingumą naudojant sudėtinius galutinės būsenos transduktorius, kurie modeliuoja konzentacines morfologines ir fonologines taisyklių pakeitimus, kurie yra unikalūs Michif. Toks taisyklėmis pagrįstas metodas yra būtinas, nes nėra pakankamai kalbų duomenų, kad būtų galima taikyti metodą, kuriuo naudojamas mašininis mokymasis. Kalbos modelis, kaip antai LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF, skatina Kanados vietinės kompiuterinės kalbos tikslus ir kartu remia Metis bendruomenės pageidaujamų dokumentų, švietimo ir atgaivinimo priemonių kūrimą.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan model pengiraan keadaan tertentu dari morfologi verbal Michif. Michif, the official language of the Metis peoples, is a uniquely mixed language with Algonquian and French origins.  Ia bercakap di seluruh negara rumah Metis di apa yang kini dipanggil Kanada dan Amerika Syarikat, tetapi ia sangat berbahaya dengan kurang dari 100 pembicara. Morfologi verbal sangat kompleks, kerana corak Algonquian polisintetik telah digabungkan dengan unsur Perancis dan interaksi morfo-fonologi unik. Model yang ditampilkan dalam kertas ini, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF mengendalikan kompleksiti ini dengan menggunakan siri transducer keadaan-tamat terkompos untuk model morfologi konkatenatif dan alternatif peraturan fonologi yang unik bagi Michif. Pendekatan berdasarkan peraturan ini diperlukan kerana tidak ada data bahasa yang cukup untuk pendekatan yang menggunakan pembelajaran mesin. Model bahasa seperti LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF melanjutkan tujuan bahasa komputasi Indigenous di Kanada sambil menyokong penciptaan alat untuk dokumentasi, pendidikan, dan kebangkitan yang diinginkan oleh komuniti Metis.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta mudell komputattiv fi stat finit tal-morfoloġija verbali ta’ Michif. Michif, il-lingwa uffiċjali tal-popli Metis, hija lingwa mħallta unikament mal-oriġini Alġjonika u Franċiża. Hija titkellem madwar il-pajjiżiet domestiċi ta’ Metis f’dak li issa jissejjaħ il-Kanada u l-Istati Uniti, iżda hija mhedda ħafna b’inqas minn 100 kelliem. Il-morfoloġija verbali hija notevolment kumplessa, peress li l-mudelli Alkonkjani diġà polisintetiċi huma kkombinati ma’ elementi Franċiżi u interazzjonijiet morfo-fonoloġiċi uniċi. Il-mudell ippreżentat f’dan id-dokument, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF jimmaniġġja din il-kumplessità billi juża serje ta’ trasduturi komposti fi stat finit biex jimmudellaw il-morfoloġija konġunattiva u l-alternattivi tar-regoli fonoloġiċi li huma uniċi għal Michif. Approċċ ibbażat fuq ir-regoli bħal dan huwa meħtieġ peress li m’hemmx biżżejjed dejta lingwistika għal approċċ li juża t-tagħlim bil-magna. A language model such as LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF furthers the goals of Indigenous computational linguistics in Canada while also supporting the creation of tools for documentation, education, and revitalization that are desired by the Metis community.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас Мичифгийн үгийн морфологийн төгсгөл хэмжээний тооцоололтын загварыг харуулдаг. Метис хүмүүсийн ерөнхийлөгчийн хэл Мичиф бол алгонкий болон французтай нэг төрлийн хэл юм. Одоо Канад болон АНУ гэдэг газрын орнууд Метис улс орон даяар ярьдаг. Гэхдээ 100 гаруй илтгэгчид маш их аюултай. Энэ үгийн морфологи нь гайхалтай төвөгтэй. Яагаад гэвэл аль хэдийн полисинтетик алгонкиан хэлбэртэй Француз элементүүд болон онцгой морфо-фонологийн харилцаа холбогдсон. Энэ цаасан дээр тайлбарласан загвар LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF нь энэ цогц цогц байдлыг ашиглаж, төгсгөл орнуудын хөгжүүлэгчдийн хэсэг нь Мичиф-д онцгой морфологи болон фонологик хуулиудыг загварчлахын тулд зохион байдлын хувь Ийм дүрэм дээр суурилсан арга нь машин суралцах арга ашиглах хэл өгөгдлийг хангалттай байдаг учраас хэрэгтэй. LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF шиг хэлний загвар Канадад байгаа Indigenous computational linguistics зорилгоог дэмжиж, мөн Metis нийгэмд хүссэн баримт, боловсрол, сэргээх хэрэгслүүдийг бүтээх боломжтой.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d മിഷിഫിന്റെ വാര്\u200dബല്\u200d മോര്\u200dഫോളജിയുടെ ഒരു ഫൈന്\u200dറ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് മോഡല്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. മിഷിഫ്, മെറ്റിസ് ജനങ്ങളുടെ ഔദ്യോഗിക ഭാഷ, അല്\u200dഗോങ്ക്വിയനും ഫ്രെഞ്ചിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങളുമായി ഒരു വിചിത്രമായ ഭാഷ. ഇപ്പോള്\u200d കാനഡയും അമേരിക്കയും എന്ന് വിളിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d മെറ്റിസ് വീടുകളുടെ മുകളില്\u200d ഇത് സംസാരിക്കുന്നു. പക്ഷെ 100 സ്പീക്ടര വാര്\u200dബല്\u200d മോര്\u200dഫോളജി വളരെ സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായിരിക്കുന്നു. പോലിസിന്റിക്ക് അല്\u200dഗോണ്\u200dക്വിയാന്\u200d മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d ഫ്രെഞ്ച് മൂലകങ്ങളും പ്രത്യേകി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d, ലി വെര്\u200dബി ക്യാവ്-ഒസിതാഹ്ക് ഡി മിച്ചിഫിന് വേണ്ടിയുള്ള ഒരു സിരിസ്റ്റ് ട്രാന്\u200dസ്റ്റേറ്റര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഈ സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണതയെ കൈ ഇതുപോലുള്ള നിയമത്തില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d യന്ത്ര പഠനം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു നടപടിയില്\u200d ഭാഷ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d മതി മെറ്റിസ് സമൂഹത്തില്\u200d ആഗ്രഹിക്കുന്ന രേഖകള്\u200d, വിദ്യാഭാഷയ്ക്കും ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നതിനും പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നതിനും സഹായിക്കുന്നു.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono skończony model obliczeniowy morfologii werbalnej Michifa. Michif, język oficjalny narodów Metysów, jest wyjątkowo mieszanym językiem z algonkijskim i francuskim pochodzeniem. Mówi się ją w krajach ojczyzny Metysów, w tym, co obecnie nazywa się Kanadą i Stanami Zjednoczonymi, ale jest bardzo zagrożone przez mniej niż 100 głośników. Morfologia werbalna jest niezwykle złożona, ponieważ już polisyntetyczne algonquiańskie wzory łączą się z elementami francuskimi i unikalnymi interakcjami morfofonologicznymi. Model przedstawiony w niniejszym artykule LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF radzi sobie z tą złożonością, wykorzystując serię skomponowanych przetworników stanowych skończonych do modelowania morfologii łączeniowej i zmian reguł fonologicznych, które są unikalne dla Michifa. Takie podejście oparte na regułach jest konieczne, ponieważ dane językowe są niewystarczające do podejścia wykorzystującego uczenie maszynowe. Model językowy, taki jak LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF, wspiera cele rdzennej językoznawstwa komputerowego w Kanadzie, a jednocześnie wspiera tworzenie narzędzi do dokumentacji, edukacji i rewitalizacji, które są pożądane przez społeczność Metis.', 'no': 'Name Michif, den offisielle språket av folket Metis, er ein enkelt blandet språk med algonquian og fransk opphav. Det vert snakket gjennom Metis-hjemlandene i det som nå kalles Canada og USA, men det er veldig vanskeleg med mindre enn 100 opplesarar. Verbelt morfologi er merkelig kompleks, sidan dei allereie polysyntetiske algonquianske mønstrene er kombinerte med fransk elementer og unike morfologiske interaksjonar. Modellen som er presentert i denne papira, handler LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF denne kompleksiteten ved å bruka ein serie av komprimerte avslutta- tilstand-transduktorar for å modellere konsatenative morfologiske og fonologiske alternatingar av reglane som er unikt for Michif. Ein regelbasert tilnærming er nødvendig fordi det finst ikkje nok språk-data for ein tilnærming som brukar maskinelæring. Eit språk-modell som LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF styrer målene til Indigenous computational linguistics i Canada mens også støttar opprettinga av verktøy for dokumentasjon, utdanning og revitalisering som er ønskt av Metis-fellesskapet.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja kompjuterski model verbalne morfologije Michif a. Michif, zvanični jezik naroda Metis a, je jedinstveno mešan jezik sa algonkijanskim i francuskim poreklima. Govori se širom domaćih zemalja Metisa u onome što se sada zove Kanada i Sjedinjene Države, ali je vrlo ugroženo manje od 100 govornika. Veralna morfologija je izuzetno kompleksna, jer su veæ polisintetičke algonkijske obrasce kombinovane sa francuskim elementima i jedinstvenim morfofonološkim interakcijama. Model koji je predstavljen u ovom papiru, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF vodi ovu kompleksnost koristeći seriju kompoziranih konačnih državnih prevodioca da modele konkatentivne morfologije i promjene fonoloških pravila koje su jedinstvene Michifu. Takav pristup na pravilima je neophodan jer nema dovoljno jezičkih podataka za pristup koji koristi učenje mašina. Jedan jezički model kao što je LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF unaprijeđuje ciljeve Indigenozne računalne lingvistike u Kanadi, dok takođe podržava stvaranje alata za dokumentaciju, obrazovanje i revitalizaciju koje žele zajednica Metis.', 'ro': 'Lucrarea prezintă un model computaţional la stări finite al morfologiei verbale a lui Michif. Michif, limba oficială a popoarelor Metis, este o limbă unic amestecată cu origini algonquiene și franceze. Se vorbește în țările natale Metis în ceea ce se numește acum Canada și Statele Unite, dar este foarte periculos cu mai puțin de 100 de vorbitori. Morfologia verbală este remarcabil de complexă, deoarece modelele algonquiene deja polisintetice sunt combinate cu elemente franceze și interacțiuni morfo-fonologice unice. Modelul prezentat în această lucrare, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF gestionează această complexitate prin utilizarea unei serii de traductoare compuse în stare finită pentru a modela morfologia concatenativă și alternările de reguli fonologice care sunt unice pentru Michif. O astfel de abordare bazată pe reguli este necesară, deoarece nu există date lingvistice suficiente pentru o abordare care utilizează învățarea automată. Un model lingvistic precum LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF promovează obiectivele lingvisticii computaționale indigene din Canada, sprijinind totodată crearea de instrumente de documentare, educație și revitalizare dorite de comunitatea Metis.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තුව මයිචිෆ්ගේ වාර්තාවික ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පෙන්වනවා. මිචිෆ්, මෙටිස් මිනිස්සුන්ගේ සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාවක්, අල්ජොන්කියාන් සහ ෆ්\u200dරෑන්ස් ප්\u200dරධාන වලින් එක ඒක මෙටිස් ගෙදර වලින් කතා කරනවා දැන් කැනඩායි ඇමරිකානු ජාතික වලින්, ඒත් ඒක ගොඩක් අනතුරු කරනවා සිපිකර් 100ක් වඩ වාර්තමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාවය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, මොකද දැනටමත් පොලිසින්ටෙටික් ඇල්ජොන්කියා The Model presed in this papers, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF manages this composity by use a series of composed end-state transducers to Model the Concathective Morology and Phonology Rule alternacions that are uniquely to Michif. මෙච්චර නීතිය අධාරිත විදියට අවශ්\u200dයයි, මෙහෙම විදියට යන්ත්\u200dරය ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් භාෂාව දත්ත LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF වගේ භාෂාව ප්\u200dරමාණයක් කැනාඩාවේ ඉන්දිජින් පණිවිඩය භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාත්මක භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාත්මකයේ ඉලක්කය සමහරවිට මෙටිස් සමාජ', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar en finit-state beräkningsmodell av den verbala morfologin av Michif. Michif, det officiella språket för Metis folk, är ett unikt blandat språk med algenskt och franskt ursprung. Det talas över Metis hemländer i det som nu kallas Kanada och USA, men det är mycket hotat med mindre än 100 talare. Den verbala morfologin är anmärkningsvärt komplex, eftersom de redan polysyntetiska algenkiska mönstren kombineras med franska element och unika morfo-fonologiska interaktioner. Modellen som presenteras i denna uppsats, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF hanterar denna komplexitet genom att använda en serie komponerade finit-state transducers för att modellera den konatenativa morfologin och fonologiska regelalternationerna som är unika för Michif. Ett sådant regelbaserat tillvägagångssätt är nödvändigt eftersom det inte finns tillräckliga språkdata för ett tillvägagångssätt som använder maskininlärning. En språkmodell som LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF främjar målen för inhemsk datorlingvistik i Kanada samtidigt som den stöder skapandet av verktyg för dokumentation, utbildning och revitalisering som efterfrågas av Metis samhället.', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaa soo saara qaab xisaab ah oo ay ku qoran yihiin noocyada dhaqanka ee Michif. Michif, afka rasmiga ah ee dadka Metis waa luuqad isku xiran oo ku qoran asalka Algonquian iyo Faraansiis. Guryaha Metis waxaa looga hadlaa marka la yidhaahdo Kanada iyo Mareykanka, laakiin waxaa aad loola dhibaateeyaa wax ka yar 100 hadal ku hadla. Qoraalka caadiga ah waa mid aad u adag, sababtoo ah dhaqanka polysynthetic Algonquian waxay ku leeyihiin xarumaha Faraansiinta iyo iskaashatada morpho-phonolojiga oo gaarka ah. Tusaaladan warqaddan lagu soo qoray LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF wuxuu qabtaa dhibaatadan si uu u isticmaalo safar oo la soo qoray oo wadamada Finite-state ah si uu u sameyno suuradda morphology iyo khilaafka nolojiga ah oo u eg Michif. Waxaa loo baahan yahay qaab caymis ah, sababtoo ah macluumaad ku filan luqada oo lagu isticmaalayo waxbarashada machine. Tusaale luqad ah, sida LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF ayaa ku qoran waxyaabaha luuqadaha xisaabta ee indigenous ee Kanada ku yaal, iyadoo sidoo kale taageeraya abuuridda qalabka loo sameeyo dukumentiyada, waxbarashada, iyo beddelinta, kuwaas oo loo baahan yahay bulshada Metis.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் மைக்கிஃபின் சொல்லாத ஆராய்ச்சியின் ஒரு மின்னெழுத்து நிலையான கணக்கீட்டு மாதிரி கூ மைக்கிஃப், மெட்டிஸ் மக்களின் வழக்கமான மொழி, ஒரு தனிப்பட்ட கலப்பு மொழி அல்கோங்குவியன் மற்றும் பிரெஞ்சு மூலம். இது மெட்டிஸ் வீட்டில் முழுவதும் பேசுகிறது இப்போது கனடா மற்றும் அமெரிக்கா என்று பேசுகிறது, ஆனால் இது 100 பேசுபவர்களுக்க வார்ப்பாட்டின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மிகவும் சிக்கலானது, ஏற்கனவே பல்கூட்டிணைப்பு அல்கோங்குவியன் மாதிரிகள் பிரெஞ்சு உறுப்புகளுடன் மற்றும இந்த காகிதத்தில் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி, LI VERB KAA- OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF இந்த சிக்கலைக் கையாளும் மைக்கிஃபுக்கு தனிப்பட்ட மாதிரி மாற்றல்களை பயன்படுத்தி ஒரு தொகுப்பிட்ட மாதிரி மா இயந்திரத்தை பயன்படுத்தும் செயல்பாட்டிற்கு போதுமான மொழி தரவு இல்லை என்பதால் இது விதியாசமான முறைமை LI VERB KAA- OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF போன்ற மொழி மாதிரி காண்டாவில் உள்ள கணிப்பு மொழிகளின் இலக்குகளை அதிகப்படுத்துகிறது, மெட்டிஸ் சமூகத்தால் விரும்பும் ஆவணங்கள், கல்வி மற்றும் மீட', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ میچیف کی ویربال مورفولوژی کی ایک مضبوط کامپیوتر کی مدل پیش کرتا ہے۔ میچیف، متیس لوگوں کی رسمی زبان ہے، ایک متیس زبان ہے جو الگونکی اور فرانسوی اصلی زبان سے مختلف ہے۔ یہ مٹیس کے گھروں میں بات کی جاتی ہے جو اب کانادا اور ایالات متحدہ ہیں، لیکن یہ 100 سے کم بولنے والے سے بہت خطرناک ہے۔ وربل مورفولوژی بڑا پیچیدہ ہے، کیونکہ پہلے سے پولیسینٹیسی الگونکی پٹرنے کے ساتھ فرانسوی элементوں اور مختلف مورفولوژیکوں کی تعاملات کے ساتھ ملے جاتے ہیں. اس کاغذ میں پیش کیے ہوئے موڈل LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF نے اس پیچیدگی کو اپنا طریقہ بنا دیا ہے کہ ایک سری مکمل ایٹ ٹرنڈوکروں کے استعمال کریں کہ مکمل موجود مورفولوژی اور فانولوژیکی قانون بدلنے کی مدل کریں جو میچیف کے لئے مختلف ہیں. یہ قانون کی بنیادی طریقہ ضروری ہے کیونکہ اس طریقہ کے لئے کافی زبان کی دکھائی نہیں ہے جو ماشین کی تعلیم استعمال کرتا ہے. ایک زبان موڈل جیسے LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF کانادا میں Indigenous computational linguistics کے موقع کو اضافہ کرتا ہے اور اس کے ساتھ مثبت, تعلیم اور دوبارہ زندہ کرنے کے لئے ابزار بنانے کی مدد کرتا ہے جو مٹیس کمونٹی کی خواہش کرتی ہے.', 'uz': "Ushbu qogʻoz Michif asboblar morphologiyasini aniqlaydi. Michif, Metis odamlarining rasmi tili, Algonquian va Fransuzcha asl asosida o'xshash bir xil tili. Bu hozir Kanada va AQSH deb nomlangan Metis uyimlarida gapiradi, lekin bu 100 gapiruvchidan ortiq xavfli. Orfologiya juda murakkablik, chunki allaqachon polysyntettika Algonquian modellari Fransuz elementlari va unik morpho-fonologik interfektlari bilan birlashgan. The model presented in this paper, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF handles this complexity by using a series of composed finite-state transducers to model the concatenative morphology and phonological rule alternations that are unique to Michif.  Ushbu qoidaga asosiy usul kerak, chunki mashinani o'rganish uchun tillar maʼlumoti yetarli emas. Name", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này tượng trưng cho mô hình tính toán giới hạn của ngôn ngữ của Michif. Michif, ngôn ngữ chính thức của thần dân Mets, là một ngôn ngữ đặc biệt hỗn hợp với dòng dõi Algonquian và Pháp. Nó được nói ra ở nhà Metis, ở những nơi mà bây giờ được gọi là Canada và Hoa Kỳ, nhưng nó đang gặp nguy hiểm lớn với một chúng chưa từng trăm người nói. Sự cố ngôn ngữ rất phức tạp, vì các mô hình Algonquian vốn đã được kết hợp với các nguyên tố Pháp và các tương tác morphine độc đáo. Mô hình được trình bày trong tờ giấy này, LILO KAA-OOOSHITAHK I MICHIF xử lý tính phức tạp này bằng cách sử dụng một loạt các máy thu nhỏ có cấu tạo ra để mô hình cho sự thay đổi quyết định cấu trúc gốc và ngôn ngữ âm thanh độc đáo của Michif. Một phương pháp dựa trên quy luật là cần thiết vì không đủ dữ liệu ngôn ngữ cho một phương pháp dùng để học máy móc. Một mô hình ngôn ngữ như Ll verB KAA-OOOSHITAHK I MICHIF thúc đẩy mục tiêu của bản tính ngôn ngữ ở Canada, đồng thời hỗ trợ việc tạo ra các công cụ về tài liệu, giáo dục, và cuộc sống mới mà cộng đồng Mets mong muốn.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя изчислителен модел на вербалната морфология на Михиф с крайно състояние. Михиф, официален език на народите Метис, е уникално смесен език с алгонкийски и френски произход. Говори се из родните земи на Метис в това, което днес се нарича Канада и Съединените щати, но е силно застрашен с по-малко от 100 оратора. Вербалната морфология е забележително сложна, тъй като вече полисинтетичните алгонкийски модели са съчетани с френски елементи и уникални морфофонологични взаимодействия. Моделът, представен в тази статия, се справя с тази сложност чрез използване на серия от композирани крайно състоятелни датчици за моделиране на конкатентативната морфология и редуванията на фонологичните правила, които са уникални за Михиф. Такъв подход, основан на правила, е необходим, тъй като няма достатъчно езикови данни за подход, който използва машинно обучение. Езиков модел като ЛИ ВЕРБ КАА-ОШИТАХК ДИ МИЧИФ подпомага целите на коренната компютърна лингвистика в Канада, като същевременно подпомага създаването на инструменти за документация, образование и ревитализация, които са желани от общността на Метис.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja krajnji računalni model verbalne morfologije Michif a. Michif, zvanični jezik naroda Metis a, je jedinstveno miješan jezik sa algonkijanskim i francuskim porijeklom. Govori se širom domaćih zemalja Metisa u onome što se sada zove Kanada i Sjedinjene Države, ali je vrlo ugroženo manje od 100 govornika. Veralna morfologija je izuzetno kompleksna, jer su već polisintetičke algonkijske obrasce kombinirane s francuskim elementima i jedinstvenim morfofonološkim interakcijama. Model predstavljen u ovom papiru, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF rješava ovu kompleksnost koristeći niz kompoziranih konačnih državnih prevodioca kako bi modelili konkatentivne morfologije i promjene fonoloških pravila koje su jedinstvene Michifu. Takav pristup na pravilima je neophodan jer nema dovoljno jezičkih podataka za pristup koji koristi učenje strojeva. Jedan jezički model poput LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF nadograđuje ciljeve Indigenozne računalne jezičke jezičke jezike u Kanadi, istovremeno podržavajući stvaranje alata za dokumentaciju, obrazovanje i revitalizaciju koje žele zajednica Metis.', 'id': 'This paper presents a finite-state computational model of the verbal morphology of Michif.  Michif, bahasa resmi rakyat Metis, adalah bahasa yang unik campuran dengan asal Algonquia dan Perancis. Hal ini dibicarakan di seluruh negeri rumah Metis di apa yang sekarang disebut Kanada dan Amerika Serikat, tetapi sangat berbahaya dengan kurang dari 100 pembicara. Morfologi verbal sangat kompleks, karena pola Algonquian polisintetik telah dikombinasikan dengan elemen Perancis dan interaksi morfo-fonologi unik. Model yang dipaparkan di kertas ini, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF menangani kompleksitas ini dengan menggunakan serangkaian transducer komposit-keadaan terbatas untuk model morfologi konktatinatif dan alternatif aturan fonologi yang unik untuk Michif. Such a rule-based approach is necessary as there is insufficient language data for an approach that uses machine learning.  A language model such as LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF furthers the goals of Indigenous computational linguistics in Canada while also supporting the creation of tools for documentation, education, and revitalization that are desired by the Metis community.', 'de': 'Die vorliegende Arbeit stellt ein Finite-State-Rechenmodell der verbalen Morphologie von Michif vor. Michif, die Amtssprache der Metis, ist eine einzigartig gemischte Sprache mit algonquischen und französischen Wurzeln. Es wird in den Metis-Heimatländern in dem gesprochen, was heute Kanada und den Vereinigten Staaten genannt wird, aber es ist mit weniger als 100-Lautsprechern stark gefährdet. Die verbale Morphologie ist bemerkenswert komplex, da die bereits polysynthetischen algonquischen Muster mit französischen Elementen und einzigartigen morphophonologischen Wechselwirkungen kombiniert werden. Das in dieser Arbeit vorgestellte Modell LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF behandelt diese Komplexität, indem eine Reihe von zusammengesetzten Finite-State-Wandlern verwendet wird, um die für Michif einzigartige konkatenative Morphologie und phonologische Regelwechsel zu modellieren. Ein solcher regelbasierter Ansatz ist notwendig, da für einen Ansatz, der maschinelles Lernen nutzt, nicht genügend Sprachdaten vorhanden sind. Ein Sprachmodell wie LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF fördert die Ziele der indigenen Computerlinguistik in Kanada und unterstützt gleichzeitig die Schaffung von Werkzeugen für Dokumentation, Bildung und Revitalisierung, die von der Metis-Gemeinschaft gewünscht werden.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert een eindige-state computationeel model van de verbale morfologie van Michif. Michif, de officiële taal van de Metis volkeren, is een unieke gemengde taal met Algonquiaanse en Franse oorsprong. Het wordt gesproken in de thuislanden van Metis in wat nu Canada en de Verenigde Staten wordt genoemd, maar het is zeer bedreigd met minder dan 100 luidsprekers. De verbale morfologie is opmerkelijk complex, aangezien de reeds polysynthetische Algonquiaanse patronen worden gecombineerd met Franse elementen en unieke morfofonologische interacties. Het model dat in dit artikel wordt gepresenteerd, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF behandelt deze complexiteit door een reeks gecomponeerde eindige-state transducers te gebruiken om de concatenatieve morfologie en fonologische regelwisselingen te modelleren die uniek zijn voor Michif. Een dergelijke regelgebaseerde aanpak is noodzakelijk omdat er onvoldoende taalgegevens zijn voor een aanpak die gebruikmaakt van machine learning. Een taalmodel zoals LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF bevordert de doelstellingen van inheemse computerlinguïstiek in Canada en ondersteunt tevens de creatie van hulpmiddelen voor documentatie, onderwijs en revitalisatie die door de Metis gemeenschap gewenst zijn.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer en finite-state beregningsmodel af den verbale morfologi af Michif. Michif, det officielle sprog for Metis folk, er et unikt blandet sprog med algenkisk og fransk oprindelse. Det tales på tværs af Metis hjemlande i det, der nu kaldes Canada og USA, men det er stærkt truet med mindre end 100 talere. Den verbale morfologi er bemærkelsesværdigt kompleks, da de allerede polysyntetiske algonquianske mønstre kombineres med franske elementer og unikke morfo-fonologiske interaktioner. Modellen præsenteret i denne artikel, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF håndterer denne kompleksitet ved at bruge en række komponerede finite-state transducere til at modellere den konatenative morfologi og fonologiske regelvekslinger, der er unikke for Michif. En sådan regelbaseret tilgang er nødvendig, da der er utilstrækkelige sprogdata til en tilgang, der anvender maskinlæring. En sprogmodel som LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF fremmer målene for oprindelig beregningslingvistik i Canada, samtidig med at den støtter skabelsen af værktøjer til dokumentation, uddannelse og revitalisering, som Metis-samfundet ønsker.', 'ko': '본고는 Michif 언어 형태의 유한한 상태 계산 모델을 제시했다.미키프어는 메티스인의 공식 언어로 독특한 혼합 언어로 아르곤어와 프랑스어에서 기원한다.현재 캐나다와 미국으로 불리는 메티스 고향에서는 사람들이 모두 이런 언어를 사용하지만, 이런 언어는 100명도 안 되는 사람들만 할 정도로 위험하다.언어 형태는 매우 복잡하다. 이미 합성된 아르곤 모델은 프랑스어 요소와 독특한 형태인 음성 상호작용과 결합되기 때문이다.본고에서 제시한 모델인 LI동사 KA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF는 일련의 조합된 유한상태 변환기를 사용하여 MICHIF 특유의 연결 형태와 음성 규칙 변화를 모의하여 이러한 복잡성을 처리했다.기계 학습 방법을 사용하는 데 충분한 언어 데이터가 없기 때문에 이런 규칙에 기초한 방법은 필요하다.VERB KA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF 등 언어 모델은 캐나다 본토 계산언어학의 목표를 추진하는 동시에 메티스 커뮤니티 창설에 필요한 문서, 교육과 진흥 도구를 지원한다.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel 'n beëindige-staat rekenaarsieële model van die verbale morfologie van Michif voorsien. Michif, die offisiele taal van die Metis volke, is 'n eenkennige gemengde taal met Algonquiaan en Frans origins. Dit word gespreek oor die Metis-tuisteland in wat nou Kanada en die Vereenigde States genoem word, maar dit is baie gevaar met minder as 100 sprekkers. Die verbale morfologie is remarkantlik kompleks, want die reeds polisintetiese Algonquiane patrone is gekombineer met Franse elemente en unieke morfologiese interaksies. Die model wat in hierdie papier voorgestel is, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF handteer hierdie kompleksiteit deur te gebruik 'n reeks van gemaakte beëindige-staat oordragters na model die samekoatenatiewe morfologie en fonologiese reël veranderinge wat unieke is aan Michif. So 'n reël-gebaseerde toegang is nodig as daar is onvoldoende taal data vir' n toegang wat masjien leer gebruik word. 'n Taal model soos LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF verbeter die doels van Indigenous rekenaarske lingwisies in Kanada terwyl ook ondersteun die skepping van nutsprogramme vir dokumentasie, opvoeding en revitalisering wat deur die Metis gemeenskap wil word.", 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک مدل کامپیوتری در حالت محدوده از مورفولوژی کلمه میچیف را نشان می دهد. میچف، زبان رسمی مردم متیس، یک زبان متیس با اصلی الگونکیان و فرانسوی است. در سراسر سرزمینهای متیس به نام کانادا و ایالات متحده صحبت می\u200cشود، ولی با کمتر از ۱۰۰ صحبت کننده خطرناک است. مورفولوژی کلمه بسیار پیچیده است، زیرا الگوهای بسیار سینتاتیک الگونکیان با عناصر فرانسوی و ارتباطات متفاوتی مورفولوژیکی است. مدل توسط این کاغذ نشان داده شده LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF این پیچیدگی را با استفاده از مجموعه ترجمه\u200cکننده\u200cهای وضعیت محدودیت ساخته برای مدل مولکولوژی مشترک و تغییرات قانون تلفن\u200cشناسی که واحد برای میچیف هستند، کنترل می\u200cکند. این روش بر پایه قانونی نیاز است چون داده های زبانی کافی برای روش استفاده از یادگیری ماشین وجود ندارد. یک مدل زبانی مانند LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF هدف زبان\u200cشناسی Indigenous Computational in Canada را بیشتر می\u200cدهد، در حالی که نیز برای ساختن ابزار برای سند\u200cسازی، آموزش و دوباره\u200cسازی که توسط جامعه متیس می\u200cخواهند پشتیبانی می\u200cکند.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የሜክሪፍ አካባቢ ሞሮፎሎጂ የሚቆጥረዋል፡፡ ሚክፍ የሜቲስ ሕዝብ ባለሥልጣዊ ቋንቋ፣ በአልጎንኪያን እና ፈረንሳይኛ ቋንቋ የተለየ ቋንቋ ነው፡፡ It is spoken across the Metis homelands in what is now called Canada and the United States, but it is highly endangered with less than 100 speakers.  የግንኙነት ሞሮፎሎጂ በጣም ደካማ ነው፣ አሁንም የፖሊስቲካዊው አሌጎንኪያን ዓይነቶች ከፈረንሳይ አካላት እና የሞሮፎ-ፎሎጂ ግንኙነት ጋር ተያያይተዋል፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ ውስጥ የተገኘው ሞዴል LI VERB KAA-OSHITAHK DI MICHIF ይህን አካውንት ይቆማል፤ ለሚኪፍ የተለየውን የፍጥረት ሀገር ተቃዋሚዎችን በመጠቀም እና የፎሎጂ ሥርዓት ምርጫዎችን ለመmodel ይችላል፡፡ እንደዚህ የሥርዓት ሥርዓት መጠቀም የቋንቋ ዳታዎችን ለመማር የሚጠቅመው መጠቀሚያ የለበትም፡፡ እንደ LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF የካናዳ አካባቢ ቋንቋዎችን አቀናቅሎታል፡፡', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaonyesha mtindo wa kompyuta wa kisiasa wa Michif. Michif, lugha rasmi ya watu wa Metis, ni lugha tofauti yenye asili ya Algonquian na Kifaransa. Inazungumzwa katika maeneo ya makazi ya Metis katika kile kinachoitwa Canada na Marekani, lakini kinahatarishwa sana na wazungumzaji chini ya 100. Kifolojia cha kawaida ni tatizo sana, kwa sababu mitindo ya Algonquia tayari yanaunganishwa na vipengele vya Kifaransa na mahusiano ya kifo-phonolojia. Mfano uliotolewa katika gazeti hili, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF hukabiliwa na utata huu kwa kutumia mfululizo wa mabadiliko yaliyotengenezwa na serikali isiyo na fedha ili kuonyesha mabadiliko ya utawala wa kifolojia na utawala wa kifolojia ambazo ni wa kipekee kwa Michif. Mtakatifu wa aina hiyo unahitajika kwa sababu kuna taarifa za lugha za kutosha kwa njia inayotumia kujifunza mashine. Mfano wa lugha kama vile LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF unaongeza malengo ya lugha za wenyeji katika Canada wakati pia inaunga mkono kutengeneza zana kwa ajili ya dokumentari, elimu na upya unaotarajiwa na jamii ya Metis.', 'sq': 'This paper presents a finite-state computational model of the verbal morphology of Michif.  Michif, gjuha zyrtare e popullit Metis, është një gjuhë unikisht e përzier me origjinën algonquiane dhe franceze. Ajo flet nëpër tokat e Metis në atë që tani quhet Kanada dhe Shtetet e Bashkuara, por është shumë e rrezikuar me më pak se 100 folës. Morfologjia verbale është jashtëzakonisht e ndërlikuar, pasi modelet polisintetike algonquiane janë kombinuar me elementet franceze dhe ndërveprimet unike morfo-fonologjike. Modeli i paraqitur në këtë letër, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF trajton këtë kompleksitet duke përdorur një seri transducatorësh të kompozuar të shtetit të kufizuar për të modeluar morfologjinë konçantative dhe ndryshimet fonologjike të rregullave që janë unike për Michif. Një qasje e tillë bazuar në rregulla është e nevojshme pasi nuk ka të dhëna të mjaftueshme gjuhësh për një qasje që përdor mësimin e makinave. Një model gjuhësh si LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF nxjerr përpara objektivat e gjuhës kompjuterike indigene në Kanada duke mbështetur gjithashtu krijimin e mjeteve për dokumentacionin, arsimin dhe ringjalljen që janë të dëshiruara nga komuniteti Metis.', 'az': "Bu kağıt Michif'in verbal morfolojisinin müəyyən-müddətli hesaplama modelini göstərir. Metis qövmünün resmi dili Mikif Alqonkian və Fransız tərəfindən bir-birinə qarışmış dildir. İndi Kanada və Amerika adlandırdığı Metis yurdlarında danışılır, amma 100-dən az danışanlardan çox tehlikedilir. Verbal morfoloji çox kompleks idi, çünki artıq polysintetik Alqonkian örtükləri Fransız elementləri ilə birləşdirilmişdir. Bu kağızda göstərilən model LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF bu kompleksitəni Mişif üçün müəyyən bir dəstə müəyyən edilmiş vəziyyətdə təkrar-dövrücülərin modelini göstərmək üçün müəyyən edilmiş kompleksitəni istifadə edir. Bu qayda-tabanlı tərzim istifadə edən maşın öyrənməsi üçün yeterli dil məlumatları olmadığı üçün lazımdır. LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF kimi dil modeli Kanadadakı Indigenous computational linguistics məqsədilərini daha da artırar, həmçin in Metis toplumunun istədiyi təhsil, təhsil və yenidən diriləcək vasitələrin yaratmasını da desteklər.", 'bn': 'This paper presents a finite-state computational model of the verbal morphology of Michif.  মিশিফ মেটিস জনগণের আনুষ্ঠানিক ভাষা, আলগঙ্কুয়ান এবং ফরাসীদের সাথে একটি অনন্য মিশ্র ভাষা। এখন কানাডা এবং যুক্তরাষ্ট্রের নামে মেটিস গৃহভূমি জুড়ে কথা বলা হয়েছে, কিন্তু এটা ১০০ জনের কম কথাবার্তার সাথে বিপদজনক। ভার্বালেল মরোফোলজি খুবই জটিল, যেহেতু ইতোমধ্যে পলিসিন্টিক আলগঙ্কুয়ান প্যাটারেন্ট ফরাসি উপাদান এবং অনন্য মোর্ফো-ফোলোজিক্যাল এই কাগজটিতে প্রকাশিত মডেল লি ভের্বি কাএ-ওশিটাহাক DI মিচিফ এই জটিলতা নিয়ন্ত্রণ করে মিশিফের কাছে অনন্য বিকল্প বিকল্পের মডেল করার মাধ্যমে একটি সিরিজ ব্যবহার করে। Such a rule-based approach is necessary as there is insufficient language data for an approach that uses machine learning.  একটি ভাষার মডেল যেমন লি ভের্বি কায়ানাডায় আদিবাসী গণনার ভাষার লক্ষ্য তৈরি করেছেন। এছাড়াও মেটিস সম্প্রদায়ের দ্বারা প্রতিষ্ঠান, শিক্ষা এবং পুনরায় প্রতিষ্ঠানের জন্য তৈরি কর', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja krajnji nacionalni računalni model verbalne morfologije Michif a. Michif, zvanični jezik naroda Metis a, je jedinstveno miješan jezik sa algonkijanskim i francuskim porijeklom. Govori se širom domaćih zemalja Metisa u onome što se sada zove Kanada i Sjedinjene Države, ali je vrlo ugroženo manje od 100 govornika. Veralna morfologija je izuzetno kompleksna, jer su već polisintetičke algonkijske obrasce kombinirane s francuskim elementima i jedinstvenim morfofonološkim interakcijama. Model predstavljen u ovom papiru, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF vodi ovu kompleksnost koristeći seriju kompoziranih konačnih prevodioca države kako bi modelili konkatentivne morfologije i promjene fonoloških pravila koje su jedinstvene Michifu. Takav pristup na pravilu je neophodan jer nema dovoljno jezičkih podataka za pristup koji koristi učenje strojeva. Jedan jezički model kao što je LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF nadograđuje ciljeve Indigenozne računalne jezičke jezike u Kanadi, dok također podržava stvaranje alata za dokumentaciju, obrazovanje i revitalizaciju koje žele zajednica Metis.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է Միչիֆ լեռական մորֆոլոգիայի սահմանափակ վիճակի հաշվարկման մոդելը: Միչիֆը, Մեթիսի ժողովրդի պաշտոնական լեզուն, միանգամայն խառնված լեզու է ալգոնքիացի և ֆրանսիացի ծագում: Այն արտահայտվում է Մեթիսի երկրներում, որոնք այժմ կոչվում են Կանադայի և ԱՄՆ, բայց այն շատ վտանգված է ավելի քիչ քան 100 խոսնակների հետ: Բառային մորֆոլոգիան շատ բարդ է, քանի որ արդեն պոլիսինթետիկ ալգոնքիայի կաղապարները համադրվում են ֆրանսիական տարրերի հետ և յուրահատուկ մորֆոֆոնոլոգիական փոխազդեցությունների հետ: The model presented in this paper, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF handles this complexity by using a series of composed finite-state transducers to model the concatenative morphology and phonological rule alternations that are unique to Michif.  Այսպիսի կանոններով հիմնված մոտեցում անհրաժեշտ է, քանի որ չկան բավարար լեզվի տվյալներ մեքենայի ուսումնասիրության համար: Լեզու մոդելը, ինչպիսին է Լի Վերբ ՔԱ-ՕՍՀԻՏԱՀK ԴԻ ՄԻՉԻՖ-ը, զարգանում է Կանադայում տեղաբնական հաշվողական լեզվաբանության նպատակները, միաժամանակ աջակցում է փաստաթղթերի, կրթության և վերականգնման գործիքների ստեղծման, որոնք Մեթիսի համայնքի ցանկանում են:', 'tr': "Bu kagyz Michif'iň verbal morfologiýasynyň beýleki ýagdaýda hasaplanýar. Mikif, Metis adamlaryň resmi dili Algonkiýan we Fransuz dili bilen bir tek çalaşyk dildir. Munuň häzirki Kanada we ABŞ adly ýerleri Metis ýerlerinde gürleşýär, ýöne 100-den az gürleşýänler bilen gaty tehlikeli. Verbal morfoloji eýýäm polysyntetik Algonküýan nusgalary Fransizça elementlerle we beýleki morfofonolojik etkileşimler bilen birleştirildir. Bu kagyzda sunulan model LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF bu karmaşıklygy çykaryp başarmak üçin birleşmiş sonrak durum terjimelerini Mişif'e beýleki morfoloji we fonolojik düzgün üýtgeşmeleri üçin ullanýar. Maşyny öwrenmek üçin ýeterlik dil maglumaty ýok ýaly düzgüne taýýarlanan ýagdaýa gerek. LI VERB KAA", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös on esitatud Michifi verbaalse morfoloogia piiritletud olekuga arvutuslik mudel. Mihif, Meti rahvaste ametlik keel, on unikaalselt segatud keel algonkia ja prantsuse päritoluga. Seda räägitakse üle Metise kodumaa niinimetatud Kanadas ja Ameerika Ühendriikides, kuid see on väga ohustatud vähem kui 100 kõnelejaga. Verbaalne morfoloogia on märkimisväärselt keeruline, sest juba niigi polüsünteesilised algonkia mustrid on kombineeritud prantsuse elementide ja unikaalsete morfofonoloogiliste interaktsioonidega. Käesolevas töös esitatud mudel LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF käsitleb seda keerukust, kasutades koostatud piiritletud oleku andurite seeriat, et modelleerida konkatenatiivset morfoloogiat ja fonoloogiliste reeglite vaheldumisi, mis on Michifi jaoks unikaalsed. Selline reeglipõhine lähenemisviis on vajalik, sest masinõpet kasutava lähenemisviisi jaoks ei ole keeleandmeid piisavalt. Keelemudel nagu LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF edendab Kanada põlisrahvaste arvutuslingvistika eesmärke, toetades samal ajal Metise kogukonna soovitud dokumenteerimise, hariduse ja taaselustamise vahendite loomist.', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje konečný výpočetní model verbální morfologie Michifa. Michif, oficiální jazyk národů Metis, je unikátně smíšený jazyk s algonquijským a francouzským původem. Mluví se napříč zeměmi Metisů v dnešní Kanadě a Spojených státech, ale je vysoce ohrožena s méně než sto reproduktorů. Verbální morfologie je pozoruhodně složitá, protože již polysyntetické algonquiánské vzory jsou kombinovány s francouzskými prvky a unikátními morfofonologickými interakcemi. Model prezentovaný v tomto článku, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF zvládá tuto složitost pomocí série složených konečných převodníků pro modelování řetězcové morfologie a fonologických střídačů, které jsou pro Michifa unikátní. Takový přístup založený na pravidlech je nezbytný, protože pro přístup využívající strojové učení nejsou dostatečné jazykové údaje. Jazykový model, jako je LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF, podporuje cíle domorodé výpočetní lingvistiky v Kanadě a zároveň podporuje tvorbu nástrojů pro dokumentaci, vzdělávání a revitalizaci, které jsou požadovány Metisovou komunitou.', 'ca': "Aquest article presenta un model computacional d'estat limitat de la morfologia verbal de Michif. Michif, la llengua oficial dels peus Metis, és una llengua únicament barrejada amb origen algonquià i francès. Es parla a través de les llars del Metis en el que ara s'anomena Canadà i els Estats Units, però està molt en perill amb menys de 100 parlants. La morfologia verbal és sorprenentment complexa, com els patrons algonquians ja polisintètics s'uneixen amb elements francesos i interaccions morfofonològiques únices. El model presentat en aquest paper, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF, gestiona aquesta complexitat utilitzant una sèrie de transdutors composts d'estat finit per modelar les alternances de la morfologia concatenativa i de la regla fonològica que són únices per Michif. Aquest enfocament basat en regles és necessàry, perquè no hi ha suficients dades de llenguatge per a un enfocament que utilitza l'aprenentatge automàtic. A language model such as LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF furthers the goals of Indigenous computational linguistics in Canada while also supporting the creation of tools for documentation, education, and revitalization that are desired by the Metis community.", 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään finite-state laskennallinen malli Michifin verbaalisesta morfologiasta. Mihif, Metis-kansojen virallinen kieli, on ainutlaatuinen sekakieli algonkialaisella ja ranskalaisella alkuperällä. Sitä puhutaan Metis-kotimaassa Kanadassa ja Yhdysvalloissa, mutta se on erittäin uhanalainen alle 100 puhujalla. Verbaalinen morfologia on huomattavan monimutkainen, sillä jo ennestään polysynteettiset algonkialaiset kuviot yhdistyvät ranskalaisiin elementteihin ja ainutlaatuisiin morfofonologisiin vuorovaikutuksiin. Tässä työssä esitelty malli LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF käsittelee tätä monimutkaisuutta käyttämällä sarjan kompositoituja finite-state-muuntimia mallintamaan konkatenatiivista morfologiaa ja fonologisia sääntöjä, jotka ovat ainutlaatuisia Michifille. Tällainen sääntöpohjainen lähestymistapa on tarpeen, koska koneoppimista hyödyntävään lähestymistapaan ei ole riittävästi kielitietoa. LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIFin kaltainen kielimalli edistää alkuperäiskansojen laskennallisen kielitieteen tavoitteita Kanadassa ja tukee myös Metis-yhteisön toivomien dokumentaatio-, koulutus- ja elvytystyökalujen luomista.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מציג מודל מחשבי במצב מוגבל של המורפולוגיה המילית של מישיף. מישיף, השפה הרשמית של אנשי מטיס, היא שפה מעורבת בייחוד עם מקור אלגונקיאני וצרפתי. It is spoken across the Metis homelands in what is now called Canada and the United States, but it is highly endangered with less than 100 speakers.  המורפולוגיה המילית מורכבת באופן יוצא דופן, כיוון שהדפוסים האלגונקיוניים הפוליסינטטיים כבר משולבים עם אלמנטים צרפתיים ואינטראקציות מורפו-פונולוגיות ייחודיות. המודל המוציא בעיתון הזה, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF מטפל במרכיבות זו על ידי השימוש בסדרה של מערכי המדינה הגבוהה מורכבים כדי לדוגמא את המורפולוגיה הקונקטנטיבית והחליפות החוקים פונולוגיים שהיו ייחודיים למישף. גישה כזו מבוססת על חוקים היא הכרחית כי אין מספיק נתונים לשפה לגישה שמשתמשת ללמוד מכונות. מודל שפה כמו LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF מגדיל את המטרות של שפת מחשב מקומית בקנדה בזמן שגם תומך ביצירת כלים לתייעוד, חינוך, וחדשה שרוצים על ידי קהילת מטיס.', 'jv': 'Perintah sing nambah ning model sing sampeyan mruput, kuwi maur. Mbih, kuwi adalah hukum sing resmi nggawe barang Metis, kuwi luwih sabanjuré karo Algonquitan lan basa Perancis. Punika dipuangkat langgar-wong liya Metis sing dumadhi iki dadi kanggo nganggo Kanadan lan Etih Uniduh, lha ngomongkane ora bisa ngono urip sing susahe warni-susahe warni. Menu The model represented in this paper, LI VerB KAA-OOOOHITOHK TIM MYHF handle this komplicité by use a set of finite-state translation packages to model the concatenative Suara bener-sistem sing diangkat kuwi nggawe rata-rata kuwi, dadi sing ora cukup nggawe gerakan kanggo nggunakake sistem kuwi mau. Sampeyan ngendah lak koyo LI VerB KAA-OOOOOHITaHK TI MIHF kuwi nggawe bukane nggolang kapan kelanganan ingkang Kapan Kapan kanggo nguasai perusahaan kelangan alat kanggo nggawe dokumen, edukaan, lan nguasai perusahaan kang dipunangé kapan Metis.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na ƙunsa da wani misali na'urar-state na ƙidãya wa mutalogi na Michif. Michif, harshen rasmi na mutane na Metis, yana da harshen mai haɗuwa da algonquian da faransa. Ana faɗa a tsakanin Metis a cikin abin da ake kiran sasa na Kanada da Marekani, kuma amma yana cikin haske da mafi ƙaranci 100 masu faɗa. The verbalar morfology is significant murakkali, as the patterns of the Polsynthetic Algonquian yanzu are kombined da elements French and unique morfo-fological interaction. Imdalin da aka bãyar da cikin wannan takardan, LI GERB KAA-OOShiTAHK Di MICRIF ya yi amfani da wannan murakkali da za'a sami wasu turjuya mai samu'a-state-na-finite to motsar masu sami'a ga kokoma-morfologi da wasu musamman na'urar folojical da masu buƙata na Michif. Wannan an a ƙayyade kowanta a kan Rubuwa, don da ba za'a da data ba ga lugha wanda za'a yi amfani da amfani da zane-zane. Salon harshe kamar LI MERB KAA-OOShiTAHK Di MIMICRIF na ƙarfafa goan da ke iya lissafar na Indawa a cikin Kanada kuma yana ƙarfafã a ƙiƙiro zane wa takardar documentation, education, da re-talization da ke so daga jamii Metis.", 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljen končni računalniški model verbalne morfologije Michifa. Mihif, uradni jezik Metičanov, je edinstveno mešan jezik algonkijskega in francoskega porekla. Govori se po domovini Metisov v Kanadi in Združenih državah Amerike, vendar je zelo ogrožena z manj kot 100 govorniki. Verbalna morfologija je izjemno kompleksna, saj so že tako polisintetični algonkijski vzorci kombinirani s francoskimi elementi in edinstvenimi morfofonološkimi interakcijami. Model, predstavljen v tem članku, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF obravnava to kompleksnost z uporabo serije sestavljenih končnih stanjskih pretvornikov za modeliranje konatenativne morfologije in izmenjave fonoloških pravil, ki so edinstveni za Michif. Tak pristop, ki temelji na pravilih, je potreben, saj ni dovolj jezikovnih podatkov za pristop, ki uporablja strojno učenje. Jezikovni model, kot je LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF, pospešuje cilje avtohtone računalniške jezikoslovnosti v Kanadi, hkrati pa podpira ustvarjanje orodij za dokumentacijo, izobraževanje in revitalizacijo, ki si jih želi Metis skupnost.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བུ་འདིས་Michif(Michif)ཡི་ཚིག་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་རྣམ་པ་ལུགས་དུས་མཐའ་མ་ཡོད་པའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་རྣམ་གྲངས Michif (Michif)མི་མང་གི་གཞུང་འབྲེལ་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་གཅིག་ནི་སྐད་རིགས་གཅིག་མཚུངས་མིན་འདུག། ད་ལྟ་བུའི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཐོག་ཏུ་མི་ཊིས་ཁི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་དང་ཨ་རིའི་སྟེང་ཐོག་ཏུ་སླེབས་པ་ཡིན། The verbal morphology is remarkably complex, as the already polysynthetic Algonquian patterns are combined with French elements and unique morpho-phonological interactions. The model presented in this paper, LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF handles this complexity by using a series of composed finite-state transducers to model the concatenative morphology and phonological rule alternations that are unique to Michif. ཉེན་རིགས་ལ་གཞི་བྱས་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་དགོས་པ་བརྟེན། སྐད་ཡིག A language model such as LI VERB KAA-OOSHITAHK DI MICHIF furthers the goals of Indigenous computational linguistics in Canada while also supporting the creation of tools for documentation, education, and revitalization that are desired by the Metis community.'}
{'en': 'A Few Topical Tweets are Enough for Effective User Stance Detection', 'ar': 'يكفي عدد قليل من التغريدات الموضوعية للكشف الفعال عن موقف المستخدم', 'pt': 'Alguns tweets tópicos são suficientes para uma detecção eficaz da postura do usuário', 'es': 'Unos cuantos tuits de actualidad son suficientes para una detección eficaz de la postura del usuario', 'fr': "Quelques tweets thématiques suffisent pour une détection efficace de la position de l'utilisateur", 'ja': '効果的なユーザーのスタンスを検出するには、いくつかのトピックのツイートで十分です', 'ru': 'Несколько тематических твитов достаточно для эффективного определения позиции пользователя', 'zh': '诸主题推文足以有效者用户立场检测', 'hi': 'कुछ सामयिक Tweets प्रभावी उपयोगकर्ता रुख का पता लगाने के लिए पर्याप्त हैं', 'ga': 'Is leor Cúpla Tweet Tráthúla chun Seasamh Úsáideora a Bhrath go hÉifeachtach', 'ka': 'Tweets are sufficient for Effective User Stance Detection', 'el': 'Μερικά επίκαιρα είναι αρκετά για την αποτελεσματική ανίχνευση στάσεων χρηστών', 'hu': 'Néhány aktuális tweet elegendő a hatékony felhasználói helyzet felismeréséhez', 'it': "Alcuni tweet topici sono sufficienti per un efficace rilevamento della posizione dell'utente", 'kk': 'Эффективті пайдаланушының станциясын анықтау үшін бірнеше нақышты Tweets жеткілікті', 'mk': 'Неколку тематични твитови се доволни за ефективно детектирање на статусот на корисникот', 'ms': 'Beberapa Tweets Topikal Cukup untuk Pengesanan Keadaan Pengguna Efektif', 'ml': 'കുറച്ചു ടൂട്ടിക്കാര്\u200d പ്രഭാവിക്കുന്ന ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ സ്റ്റേന്\u200dസ് ഡിറ്ററിന് മതിയാകുന്നു', 'mt': 'Ftit Tweets Topikali huma biżżejjed għad-Detezzjoni Effettiva tal-Istanza tal-Utent', 'mn': 'Хэдэн сайн tweets нь эффектив хэрэглэгч Stance Detection дэх хангалттай', 'no': 'Ein få topptekst er nok for å finna effektiv brukar', 'pl': 'Kilka aktualnych tweetów wystarczy do efektywnego wykrywania stanu użytkownika', 'ro': 'Câteva tweeturi tematice sunt suficiente pentru detectarea eficientă a stării utilizatorilor', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරභාවිත ප්\u200dරවේශකය ස්ටැන්ස් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විතරක් ටිකක් විතරයි.', 'sr': 'Malo Topičnih Tweets je dovoljno za otkrivanje efektivnog stanja korisnika', 'lt': 'Kelių teminių Tweetų pakanka veiksmingam vartotojo pozicijos nustatymui', 'sv': 'Några aktuella tweets räcker för effektiv identifiering av användarställning', 'so': 'Inta yar ee la xidhiidha waxyaabaha badan waxaa ku filan tijaabiya shaqaalaha', 'ta': 'ஒரு சில தலைப்புகள் பயன்படுத்துபவர் நிலையை கண்டுபிடிக்க போதுமானது', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một ít Tweet âm bản là đủ cho việc phát hiện hiệu quả trạng thái người dùng', 'hr': 'Malo Topičnih Tweets je dovoljno za otkrivanje učinkovitog stanja korisnika', 'bg': 'Няколко тематични туита са достатъчни за ефективно откриване на потребителското положение', 'da': 'Et par aktuelle tweets er nok til effektiv registrering af brugerstilling', 'nl': 'Een paar topische tweets zijn genoeg voor effectieve detectie van gebruikersstandpunten', 'de': 'Ein paar topische Tweets reichen für eine effektive User Stance Detection aus', 'ko': '몇 개의 핫한 트윗은 사용자의 입장을 효과적으로 측정하기에 충분하다', 'id': 'Sebuah Tweet Topikal Beberapa Cukup untuk Deteksi Stands Pengguna Efektif', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Twiti chache za mada zinatosha kwa ajili ya Kuchunguza Usumiaji wenye ufanisi', 'tr': 'Etkinlik Ullançy Teňkilamasy üçin birnäçe Topary Tweets ýeterli', 'sq': 'Disa Tweets tematike janë të mjaftueshme për zbulimin efektiv të qëndrimit të përdoruesit', 'az': 'Biraz Topic Tweets Efektiv User Stance Detection üçün Yeterdir', 'af': 'Description', 'hy': 'Մի քանի թեմային թվիթեր բավարար են արդյունավետ օգտագործողի կայուն հայտնաբերելու համար', 'bs': 'Malo Topičnih Tweets je dovoljno za otkrivanje efektivnog stanja korisnika', 'am': 'የጥቂት Topical Tweets ይበቃል барои Effective User Stance Detection', 'ca': 'Uns pocs tweets temàtics són suficients per a detectar la posició efectiva dels usuaris', 'cs': 'Několik aktuálních tweetů stačí pro efektivní detekci postoje uživatele', 'et': 'Mõned teemalised tweetid on piisavad tõhusaks kasutaja seisundi tuvastamiseks', 'bn': 'কার্যকর ব্যবহারকারী স্টেন সনাক্তের জন্য একটি কয়েকটি টুইট যথেষ্ট', 'fi': 'Muutama ajankohtainen twiitti riittää tehokkaaseen käyttäjän asenteiden tunnistamiseen', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'he': 'כמה טוויטים נושאיים מספיקים לגלות מצב משתמש יעיל', 'sk': 'Nekaj tematskih tweetov je dovolj za učinkovito zaznavanje stanja uporabnikov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'གནད་དོན་བརྗོད་ཐོག་ཙམ་འབྲས་མེད་པ་ལས་ནུས་པ་ཐལ་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'User stance detection entails ascertaining the position of a user towards a target, such as an entity, topic, or claim. Recent work that employs unsupervised classification has shown that performing stance detection on vocal Twitter users, who have many tweets on a target, can be highly accurate (+98 %). However, such methods perform poorly or fail completely for less vocal users, who may have authored only a few tweets about a target. In this paper, we tackle stance detection for such users using two approaches. In the first approach, we improve user-level stance detection by representing tweets using contextualized embeddings, which capture latent meanings of words in context. We show that this approach outperforms two strong baselines and achieves 89.6 % accuracy and 91.3 % macro F-measure on eight controversial topics. In the second approach, we expand the tweets of a given user using their Twitter timeline tweets, which may not be topically relevant, and then we perform unsupervised classification of the user, which entails clustering a user with other users in the training set. This approach achieves 95.6 % accuracy and 93.1 % macro F-measure.', 'pt': 'A detecção de postura do usuário envolve determinar a posição de um usuário em relação a um alvo, como uma entidade, tópico ou reivindicação. Trabalhos recentes que empregam classificação não supervisionada mostraram que a detecção de postura em usuários vocais do Twitter, que têm muitos tweets em um alvo, pode ser altamente precisa (+98%). No entanto, esses métodos têm um desempenho ruim ou falham completamente para usuários menos vocais, que podem ter criado apenas alguns tweets sobre um alvo. Neste artigo, abordamos a detecção de postura para esses usuários usando duas abordagens. Na primeira abordagem, melhoramos a detecção de postura no nível do usuário ao representar tweets usando embeddings contextualizados, que capturam significados latentes de palavras no contexto. Mostramos que essa abordagem supera duas linhas de base fortes e atinge 89,6% de precisão e 91,3% de macro F-measure em oito tópicos controversos. Na segunda abordagem, expandimos os tweets de um determinado usuário usando seus tweets da linha do tempo do Twitter, que podem não ser topicamente relevantes, e então realizamos a classificação não supervisionada do usuário, o que implica agrupar um usuário com outros usuários no conjunto de treinamento. Essa abordagem atinge 95,6% de precisão e 93,1% de macro F-measure.', 'ar': 'يستلزم اكتشاف موقف المستخدم التحقق من موقف المستخدم تجاه الهدف ، مثل كيان أو موضوع أو مطالبة. أظهر العمل الأخير الذي يستخدم تصنيفًا غير خاضع للإشراف أن إجراء اكتشاف الموقف لمستخدمي تويتر الصوتي ، الذين لديهم العديد من التغريدات على أحد الأهداف ، يمكن أن يكون دقيقًا للغاية (+ 98٪). ومع ذلك ، فإن مثل هذه الأساليب تؤدي أداءً ضعيفًا أو تفشل تمامًا للمستخدمين الأقل صوتًا ، والذين ربما كتبوا عددًا قليلاً فقط من التغريدات حول هدف ما. في هذه الورقة ، نتناول اكتشاف الموقف لهؤلاء المستخدمين باستخدام طريقتين. في النهج الأول ، نقوم بتحسين اكتشاف الموقف على مستوى المستخدم من خلال تمثيل التغريدات باستخدام الزخارف السياقية ، والتي تلتقط المعاني الكامنة للكلمات في السياق. نوضح أن هذا النهج يتفوق في الأداء على خطين أساسيين قويين ويحقق دقة 89.6٪ و 91.3٪ مقياس F الكلي في ثمانية موضوعات مثيرة للجدل. في الطريقة الثانية ، نقوم بتوسيع تغريدات مستخدم معين باستخدام تغريداته على الجدول الزمني لتويتر ، والتي قد لا تكون ذات صلة بموضوع معين ، ثم نقوم بتصنيف المستخدم بدون إشراف ، مما يستلزم تجميع مستخدم مع مستخدمين آخرين في مجموعة التدريب. يحقق هذا الأسلوب دقة 95.6٪ و 93.1٪ قياس F الكلي.', 'es': 'La detección de la postura del usuario implica determinar la posición de un usuario hacia un objetivo, como una entidad, un tema o un reclamo. Un trabajo reciente que emplea la clasificación no supervisada ha demostrado que realizar la detección de posturas en usuarios de Twitter que hablan mucho, que tienen muchos tuits en un objetivo, puede ser muy preciso (+98%). Sin embargo, estos métodos funcionan mal o fallan por completo para los usuarios menos vocales, quienes pueden haber escrito solo unos pocos tuits sobre un objetivo. En este artículo, abordamos la detección de posturas para dichos usuarios mediante dos enfoques. En el primer enfoque, mejoramos la detección de posturas a nivel de usuario mediante la representación de tuits mediante incrustaciones contextualizadas, que capturan los significados latentes de las palabras en contexto. Demostramos que este enfoque supera a dos líneas de base sólidas y logra una precisión del 89,6% y una medida F macro del 91,3% en ocho temas controvertidos. En el segundo enfoque, ampliamos los tuits de un usuario determinado utilizando sus tuits de la cronología de Twitter, que pueden no ser relevantes en el tema, y luego realizamos una clasificación no supervisada del usuario, lo que implica agrupar a un usuario con otros usuarios en el conjunto de entrenamiento. Este enfoque logra una precisión del 95,6% y una medición F macro del 93,1%.', 'fr': "La détection de la position de l'utilisateur consiste à déterminer la position d'un utilisateur par rapport à une cible, telle qu'une entité, un sujet ou une revendication. Des travaux récents utilisant une classification non supervisée ont montré que la détection de position sur des utilisateurs vocaux de Twitter, qui ont de nombreux tweets sur une cible, peut être très précise (+98\xa0%). Cependant, ces méthodes fonctionnent mal ou échouent complètement pour les utilisateurs moins vocaux, qui peuvent n'avoir écrit que quelques tweets sur une cible. Dans cet article, nous abordons la détection de la position de ces utilisateurs en utilisant deux approches. Dans la première approche, nous améliorons la détection de position au niveau de l'utilisateur en représentant les tweets à l'aide d'intégrations contextualisées, qui capturent les significations latentes des mots dans leur contexte. Nous montrons que cette approche surpasse deux niveaux de référence solides et atteint une précision de 89,6\xa0% et une mesure macro F de 91,3\xa0% sur huit sujets controversés. Dans la seconde approche, nous développons les tweets d'un utilisateur donné en utilisant les tweets de son fil Twitter, qui peuvent ne pas être pertinents sur le plan thématique, puis nous effectuons une classification non supervisée de l'utilisateur, ce qui implique de regrouper un utilisateur avec d'autres utilisateurs dans l'ensemble de formation. Cette approche permet d'obtenir une précision de 95,6\xa0% et une macromesure F de 93,1\xa0%.", 'zh': '用户姿检须定用户对(如实体、主题、声明)位。 近采无监类之明,在上多推文声Twitter用户行势检测可极确(+ 98%)。 然于声少之用户,其性差败,用户可数推文也。 本文中,用二法解此用户姿态检测。 第一法,以上下文嵌之推文来改进用户级检测,此嵌获上下文中单词之义也。 吾明此术优于两强之基线,而八争之言成89.6%之准确率与91.3%之宏观F相度也。 二法者,吾用给定用户之 Twitter 时推文(或无主相关性)广给定用户之推文,然后无监分于用户,此用户之所以聚类用户也。 此术成95.6%之准确率,与93.1%之宏观F测也。', 'hi': 'उपयोगकर्ता रुख का पता लगाने पर किसी लक्ष्य के प्रति उपयोगकर्ता की स्थिति का पता लगाना शामिल है, जैसे कि एक इकाई, विषय, या दावा। हाल के काम जो असुरक्षित वर्गीकरण को नियोजित करते हैं, ने दिखाया है कि मुखर ट्विटर उपयोगकर्ताओं पर रुख का पता लगाने का प्रदर्शन करना, जिनके पास लक्ष्य पर कई ट्वीट हैं, अत्यधिक सटीक (+98%) हो सकते हैं। हालांकि, इस तरह के तरीके खराब प्रदर्शन करते हैं या कम मुखर उपयोगकर्ताओं के लिए पूरी तरह से विफल हो जाते हैं, जिन्होंने लक्ष्य के बारे में केवल कुछ ट्वीट्स लिखे हो सकते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम दो दृष्टिकोणों का उपयोग करके ऐसे उपयोगकर्ताओं के लिए रुख का पता लगाने से निपटते हैं। पहले दृष्टिकोण में, हम संदर्भित एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करके ट्वीट्स का प्रतिनिधित्व करके उपयोगकर्ता-स्तर के रुख का पता लगाने में सुधार करते हैं, जो संदर्भ में शब्दों के अव्यक्त अर्थों को कैप्चर करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि यह दृष्टिकोण दो मजबूत बेसलाइनों को मात देता है और आठ विवादास्पद विषयों पर 89.6% सटीकता और 91.3% मैक्रो एफ-माप प्राप्त करता है। दूसरे दृष्टिकोण में, हम अपने ट्विटर टाइमलाइन ट्वीट्स का उपयोग करके किसी दिए गए उपयोगकर्ता के ट्वीट्स का विस्तार करते हैं, जो शीर्ष रूप से प्रासंगिक नहीं हो सकता है, और फिर हम उपयोगकर्ता का असुरक्षित वर्गीकरण करते हैं, जो प्रशिक्षण सेट में अन्य उपयोगकर्ताओं के साथ एक उपयोगकर्ता को क्लस्टर करने पर जोर देता है। यह दृष्टिकोण 95.6% सटीकता और 93.1% मैक्रो एफ-माप प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Обнаружение положения пользователя влечет за собой определение положения пользователя по отношению к цели, такой как объект, тема или утверждение. Недавняя работа, в которой используется неконтролируемая классификация, показала, что определение положения на вокальных пользователях Twitter, у которых есть много твитов на мишени, может быть очень точным (+98%). Однако такие методы работают плохо или полностью не работают для менее вокальных пользователей, которые, возможно, написали всего несколько твитов о цели. В этой статье мы рассматриваем обнаружение положения для таких пользователей с помощью двух подходов. В первом подходе мы улучшаем обнаружение позиции на уровне пользователя, представляя твиты с использованием контекстуализированных вложений, которые фиксируют скрытые значения слов в контексте. Мы показываем, что этот подход превосходит две сильные базовые линии и достигает 89,6% точности и 91,3% макро- F-измерения по восьми спорным темам. Во втором подходе мы расширяем твиты данного пользователя, используя их твиты временной шкалы Twitter, которые могут быть не актуальны по теме, а затем выполняем неконтролируемую классификацию пользователя, что влечет за собой кластеризацию пользователя с другими пользователями в обучающем наборе. Этот подход обеспечивает 95,6% точность и 93,1% макро- F-измерение.', 'ja': 'ユーザスタンス検出は、エンティティ、トピック、または特許請求の範囲などのターゲットに対するユーザの位置を確認することを伴う。 監督されていない分類を採用した最近の研究では、ターゲットに多くのツイートを持つボーカルTwitterユーザーでスタンス検出を行うことは非常に正確であることが示されています（+98 ％ ）。 しかしながら、このような方法は、ターゲットに関するわずかなツイートを作成した可能性のある、声の少ないユーザーにとってはパフォーマンスが悪かったり、完全に失敗したりする。 本稿では、そのようなユーザに対するスタンス検出について、2つのアプローチを用いて取り組む。 最初のアプローチでは、コンテキスト化された埋め込みを使用してツイートを表現することで、ユーザーレベルのスタンス検出を改善します。これは、コンテキスト内の単語の潜在的な意味を捕捉します。 このアプローチは、2つの強力なベースラインを上回り、8つの物議を醸すトピックで89.6 ％の精度と91.3 ％のマクロFメジャーを達成していることを示しています。 第２のアプローチでは、所与のユーザーのTwitterタイムラインツイートを使用して拡張し、トレーニングセット内の他のユーザーとユーザーをクラスタリングすることを伴う、ユーザーの監督されていない分類を実行します。 このアプローチは、95.6 ％の精度と93.1 ％のマクロFメジャーを達成します。', 'ga': 'Is éard atá i gceist le seasamh úsáideora a fháil amach suíomh úsáideora i dtreo sprice, amhail eintiteas, topaic, nó éileamh. Tá sé léirithe ag obair le déanaí a úsáideann rangú gan mhaoirseacht gur féidir a bheith an-chruinn (+98%) chun seasamh a bhrath ar úsáideoirí gutha Twitter, a bhfuil go leor tweets acu ar sprioc. Mar sin féin, ní oibríonn modhanna den sórt sin go dona nó teipeann orthu go hiomlán i gcás úsáideoirí nach bhfuil an oiread sin cainte acu, b’fhéidir nach bhfuil ach cúpla tweets scríofa acu faoi sprioc. Sa pháipéar seo, téimid i ngleic le seasamh a bhrath úsáideoirí den sórt sin trí dhá chur chuige a úsáid. Sa chéad chur chuige, feabhsaítear braite seasaimh úsáideora trí thíteanna a léiriú trí úsáid a bhaint as leabaithe comhthéacsaithe, a ghlacann bríonna folaigh na bhfocal i gcomhthéacs. Léirímid go sáraíonn an cur chuige seo dhá bhonnlíne láidre agus go mbaineann sé amach cruinneas 89.6% agus beart macra-F 91.3% ar ocht ábhar conspóideach. Sa dara cur chuige, leathnóimid tweets úsáideora ar leith ag baint úsáide as a gcuid tvuíteanna amlíne Twitter, rud nach bhfuil ábhartha ó thaobh topaic de, agus ansin déanaimid aicmiú gan mhaoirseacht ar an úsáideoir, rud a chiallaíonn úsáideoir a bhraisliú le húsáideoirí eile sa tacar oiliúna. Baineann an cur chuige seo amach 95.6% cruinneas agus 93.1% beart-F macra.', 'ka': 'მომხმარებელი სტანციის განსახულება იქნება მომხმარებელი სტანციაზე, როგორც ინტერტი, თემი, ან შესახებ. ახალი სამუშაო სამუშაო, რომელიც გამოყენებს არ განსხვავებული კლასიფიკაცია, გამოჩენა, რომ სიტყვების Twitter მომხმარებისთვის სტანსტის განსხვავება, რომელიც აქვს მრავალი ტივიტები მი მაგრამ ასეთი მეტოვები ცოტა ან შეუძლებელია ყველაფერი სიტყვების გამოყენებელისთვის, რომელიც შეიძლება მხოლოდ რამდენიმე სიტყვების შესახებ დააწყენ ამ დოკუნეში, ჩვენ სტანციის განახლებას მომხმარებლებისთვის გამოყენებთ ორი მიღება. პირველი პროგრამაში, ჩვენ გამოყენებელი სტანციის განვიხოვრებით, რომლებიც კონტექსტუალურად გამოყენებული სიტყვების მნიშვნელობების გამოყენებით, რომელიც კონტექსტუალ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ეს პროგრამა უფრო გავაკეთება ორი ძალიან ფესტური ხაზები და 89,6%-ის წესიერება და 91,3%-ის მაკრო F-მაზები 8 კონტრობური ტემებზე. მეორე პროგრამაში, ჩვენ გავაკეთებეთ მომხმარებლის რვიტები, რომელიც შეიძლება არ იყოს ტემიკურად მნიშვნელოვანი, და შემდეგ ჩვენ მომხმარებლის კლასიფიკაციას გავაკეთებთ, რომელიც სხვა მომხმარებლის სხვა მომ ეს პროგრამა 95,6% წარმოდგენა წარმოდგენა წარმოდგენება და 93,1% მაკრო F- მაზრი.', 'hu': 'A felhasználói állás felismerése magában foglalja a felhasználó pozíciójának megállapítását egy célhoz, például egy entitáshoz, témához vagy követeléshez. A felügyelet nélküli osztályozást alkalmazó közelmúltbeli munkák azt mutatták, hogy a hangos Twitter-felhasználók álláspontjelemzése nagyon pontos lehet (+98%). Azonban az ilyen módszerek rosszul teljesítenek vagy teljesen sikertelenül teljesítenek a kevésbé hangos felhasználók számára, akik csak néhány tweetet írtak egy célpontról. Ebben a tanulmányban két megközelítéssel foglalkozunk az ilyen felhasználók álláspontjainak felismerésével. Az első megközelítésben javítjuk a felhasználói szintű álláspont felismerését azáltal, hogy a tweeteket kontextuálisan beágyazott beágyazásokkal képviseljük, amelyek megragadják a szavak rejtett jelentését kontextusban. Megmutatjuk, hogy ez a megközelítés két erős alapvető értéket felülmúl, és 89,6%-os pontosságot és 91,3%-os makro F-mérést ér el nyolc vitatott témában. A második megközelítésben egy adott felhasználó tweetjeit a Twitter idővonal tweetjeivel bővítjük, amelyek nem lehetnek aktuálisan relevánsak, majd felügyelet nélküli besorolást végezünk a felhasználó felügyelet nélküli besorolásával, ami magában foglalja a felhasználók klaszterezését más felhasználókkal a képzési készletben. Ez a megközelítés 95,6%-os pontosságot és 93,1%-os makro F-mérést ér el.', 'el': 'Η ανίχνευση στάσεων χρήστη συνεπάγεται την εξακρίβωση της θέσης ενός χρήστη προς έναν στόχο, όπως μια οντότητα, ένα θέμα ή μια αξίωση. Πρόσφατες εργασίες που χρησιμοποιούν χωρίς επίβλεψη ταξινόμηση έχουν δείξει ότι η ανίχνευση στάσεων σε φωνητικούς χρήστες του Twitter, οι οποίοι έχουν πολλά tweets σε έναν στόχο, μπορεί να είναι εξαιρετικά ακριβής (+98%). Ωστόσο, τέτοιες μέθοδοι αποδίδουν άσχημα ή αποτυγχάνουν εντελώς για λιγότερο φωνητικούς χρήστες, οι οποίοι μπορεί να έχουν συντάξει μόνο μερικά tweets σχετικά με έναν στόχο. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εξετάζουμε την ανίχνευση στάσεων για τέτοιους χρήστες χρησιμοποιώντας δύο προσεγγίσεις. Στην πρώτη προσέγγιση, βελτιώνουμε την ανίχνευση στάσεων σε επίπεδο χρήστη αναπαράγοντας τα tweets χρησιμοποιώντας ενσωματωμένες στο πλαίσιο, οι οποίες καταγράφουν λανθάνουσες έννοιες λέξεων στο πλαίσιο. Δείχνουμε ότι η προσέγγιση αυτή ξεπερνά δύο ισχυρές γραμμές βάσης και επιτυγχάνει ακρίβεια 89,6% και μακρομετρικό μέτρο 91,3% σε οκτώ αμφιλεγόμενα θέματα. Στη δεύτερη προσέγγιση, επεκτείνουμε τα tweets ενός συγκεκριμένου χρήστη χρησιμοποιώντας τα tweets της λωρίδας χρόνου του Twitter, τα οποία μπορεί να μην είναι επίκαιρα, και στη συνέχεια εκτελούνται χωρίς επίβλεψη ταξινόμηση του χρήστη, η οποία συνεπάγεται ομαδοποίηση ενός χρήστη με άλλους χρήστες στο εκπαιδευτικό σύνολο. Αυτή η προσέγγιση επιτυγχάνει ακρίβεια 95,6% και μακρομετρικό μέτρο 93,1% F.', 'lt': 'Naudotojo pozicijos nustatymas reiškia, kad nustatoma naudotojo padėtis tikslo atžvilgiu, pavyzdžiui, subjektas, tema arba teiginys. Neseniai atliktas darbas, kuriame naudojama nepastebima klasifikacija, parodė, kad balso Twitter naudotojų, turinčių daug tweetų apie tikslą, pozicijų nustatymas gali būti labai tikslus (+98 %). Tačiau tokie metodai blogai veikia arba visiškai neveikia mažiau balsuojantiems vartotojams, kurie galėjo parašyti tik kelis tweetus apie tikslą. Šiame dokumente sprendžiame tokių naudotojų pozicijų nustatymą taikant du metodus. Pirmuoju požiūriu pageriname vartotojo lygmens pozicijų nustatymą, atstovaudami tweetus naudojant kontekstinius įterpimus, kurie atspindi latentines žodžių reikšmes kontekste. Mes parodome, kad šis požiūris viršija du tvirtus pagrindus ir 89,6 proc. tikslumo ir 91,3 proc. makrofinansinės priemonės aštuoniais prieštaringais klausimais. Antruoju požiūriu išplečiame tam tikro naudotojo tweetus naudojant savo Twitter laikrodžio tweetus, kurie galbūt nėra aktualūs, ir tada atliekame nepastebimą naudotojo klasifikaciją, kuri reiškia, kad naudotojas įtraukiamas į mokymo rinkinį su kitais naudotojais. Šis metodas užtikrina 95,6 % tikslumą ir 93,1 % makrofinansinę priemonę.', 'it': "Il rilevamento della posizione dell'utente implica l'accertamento della posizione di un utente verso un target, come un'entità, un argomento o un reclamo. Recenti lavori che utilizzano una classificazione non supervisionata hanno dimostrato che eseguire il rilevamento della posizione sugli utenti vocali di Twitter, che hanno molti tweet su un target, può essere altamente accurato (+98%). Tuttavia, tali metodi funzionano male o falliscono completamente per gli utenti meno vocali, che potrebbero aver scritto solo pochi tweet su un target. In questo articolo, affrontiamo il rilevamento delle posizioni per tali utenti utilizzando due approcci. Nel primo approccio, miglioriamo il rilevamento delle posizioni a livello di utente rappresentando i tweet utilizzando incorporazioni contestualizzate, che catturano i significati latenti delle parole nel contesto. Mostriamo che questo approccio supera due forti linee di base e raggiunge l'89,6% di precisione e il 91,3% di macro F-misura su otto argomenti controversi. Nel secondo approccio, espandiamo i tweet di un determinato utente utilizzando i tweet della timeline di Twitter, che potrebbero non essere di attualità, e poi eseguiamo la classificazione non supervisionata dell'utente, che comporta il raggruppamento di un utente con altri utenti nel set di formazione. Questo approccio raggiunge una precisione del 95,6% e una misura macro F del 93,1%.", 'kk': 'Пайдаланушының жағдайын анықтау үшін пайдаланушының мақсатты, нақышты немесе сұрақтарының орнын анықтау үшін. Жуырдағы жұмыс істемеген классификациялық жұмыс қолданатын Дыбыс Твиттер пайдаланушыларының көптеген таңдау орындалығын көрсету мүмкін (+98%) дегенді көрсетеді. Бірақ бұл әдістер мақсат туралы бірнеше tweet құқықтарын тек бірнеше аутентификациялау мүмкін емес немесе сөз пайдаланушыларға толық жарамсыз істейді. Бұл қағазда, осылай пайдаланушыларды екі жағдай қолданатын көзгерістерді табуға арналады. Бірінші жағдайда, қолданушы деңгейіндегі таңдау арқылы, жағдайда контексті тіркелген ендіру арқылы, сөздердің соңғы мәліметтерін көрсетеді. Бұл тәсілді екі күшті негізгі жолдардан шығарып, 89,6% дұрыстығын және 91,3% макро-F-өлшемі сегіз қатысты нақыштарда жеткізеді. Екінші жағдайда, біз келтірілген пайдаланушының Twitter уақыт сызығын қолдануға арналған tweets таратып, оның маңызды емес болуы мүмкін. Содан кейін біз пайдаланушының бағытталмаған классификациясын орындаймыз. Бұл бағытталған пайдала Бұл тәсілі 95,6% дұрыс және 93,1% макро F- өлшемі жеткізеді.', 'mk': 'Детектирањето на ставот на корисникот вклучува проверка на позицијата на корисникот кон целта, како што е ентитет, тема или тврдење. Неодамнешната работа која вработува ненадгледувана класификација покажа дека извршувањето на детекција на ставови на гласните корисници на Твитер, кои имаат многу твитови на целта, може да биде многу прецизно (+98 %). Сепак, ваквите методи работат лошо или не успеваат целосно за помалку гласни корисници, кои можеби авторирале само неколку твитови за целта. Во овој весник, се справуваме со детекцијата на ставови за ваквите корисници користејќи два пристапи. Во првиот пристап, го подобруваме детекцијата на ставот на корисничко ниво со претставување на твитови користејќи контекстуални вложувања, кои прифаќаат лантни значења на зборовите во контекст. Ние покажуваме дека овој пристап надминува две силни основни линии и постигнува 89,6 отсто точност и 91,3 отсто макро-мерка Ф на осум контроверзни теми. In the second approach, we expand the tweets of a given user using their Twitter timeline tweets, which may not be topically relevant, and then we perform unsupervised classification of the user, which entails clustering a user with other users in the training set.  This approach achieves 95.6% accuracy and 93.1% macro F-measure.', 'ml': 'ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ സ്ഥിതി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിന് ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്റെ നേരെ ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ സ്ഥാനം തിരിച്ചറിയേണ്ടതുണ സംരക്ഷിക്കാത്ത ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ജോലി ചെയ്യുന്ന അടുത്ത പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു വോള്\u200d ടൂട്ടര്\u200d ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ സ്ഥിതി കണ്ടു എങ്കിലും ഇത്തരം രീതികള്\u200d അസാധാരണമാണ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നത്, അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d കുറച്ച് ശബ്ദം ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് തോല്\u200dപ്പ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഈ ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്കുള്ള സ്ഥിതി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ട് വഴികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ആദ്യത്തെ രീതിയില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ നില സ്ഥിതി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് കൂടുതല്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. വാക്കുകളുടെ അടുത നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നത് ഈ പ്രായോഗ്യം രണ്ട് ശക്തിയുള്ള ബേസ്ലെയിനുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു എന്നിട്ട് 89. 6% ശ In the second approach, we expand the tweets of a given user using their Twitter timeline tweets, which may not be topically relevant, and then we perform unsupervised classification of the user, which entails clustering a user with other users in the training set.  ഈ നടപടി 95. 6% ശരിയാണ് എത്തുന്നത്. 93. 1% മാക്രോ എഫ് മാക്രോ.', 'no': 'Oppdaging av brukarstasjon inneheld å bestemme posisjonen til ein brukar mot eit mål, som eit entitet, emne eller tiltak. Nyleg brukte arbeid som arbeider med usikkerte klassifikasjon har vist at oppdaginga av stasjonsoppdaging på vokal-Twitter-brukarar, som har mange tweeter på eit mål, kan vera svært nøyaktig (+98%). Desse metodane utfører imidlertid slik dårlig eller feil fullstendig for mindre lysbrukarar, som kan ha retta berre nokre twett om eit mål. I denne papiret løyser vi oppdaging av stasjon for slike brukarar med to tilnærmingar. I den første tilnærminga er vi forbetra oppdaging av brukarnivået ved å representera tweets med kontekstualiserte innbygging, som får latere betydningar av ord i kontekst. Vi viser at denne tilnærminga utfører to sterke baselinjer og oppnår 89,6 % nøyaktighet og 91,3 % makro-F-mål på åtte kontroversive emne. I den andre tilnærminga utvidar vi tweetene til ein gitt brukar med tweetene sin tidslinje på Twitter, som kanskje ikkje er tematisk relevant, og så utfører vi ikkje oppretta klassifikasjon av brukaren, som inneheld å klassera ein brukar med andre brukarar i opplæringssettet. Denne tilnærminga gjer 95,6 % nøyaktig og 93,1 % makro-F-mål.', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie stanowiska użytkownika polega na ustaleniu pozycji użytkownika wobec celu, takiego jak podmiot, temat lub roszczenie. Ostatnie prace wykorzystujące klasyfikację bez nadzoru pokazały, że wykrywanie stanowiska wokalnych użytkowników Twittera, którzy mają wiele tweetów na celu, może być bardzo dokładne (+98%). Jednak takie metody działają słabo lub całkowicie nie udają się w przypadku mniej wokalnych użytkowników, którzy mogli napisać tylko kilka tweetów o celu. W niniejszym artykule zajmujemy się wykrywaniem stanowiska dla takich użytkowników przy użyciu dwóch podejść. W pierwszym podejściu poprawiamy wykrywanie stanowisk na poziomie użytkownika poprzez reprezentowanie tweetów za pomocą kontekstowych osadzeń, które przechwytują ukryte znaczenia słów w kontekście. Pokazujemy, że podejście to przewyższa dwie silne linie bazowe i osiąga dokładność 89,6% oraz makro F-miarę 91,3% w ośmiu kontrowersyjnych tematach. W drugim podejściu rozszerzamy tweety danego użytkownika za pomocą jego tweetów na linii czasu Twittera, które mogą nie być aktualnie istotne, a następnie przeprowadzamy bez nadzoru klasyfikację użytkownika, co polega na klastrowaniu użytkownika z innymi użytkownikami w zestawie szkoleniowym. Takie podejście osiąga dokładność 95,6% i makro F-miar 93,1% .', 'ms': 'Pengesanan kedudukan pengguna melibatkan memastikan kedudukan pengguna ke arah sasaran, seperti entiti, topik, atau klaim. Kerja baru-baru ini yang menggunakan klasifikasi tidak diawasi telah menunjukkan bahawa mengesan kedudukan pada pengguna Twitter suara, yang mempunyai banyak tweet pada sasaran, boleh sangat tepat (+98%). Bagaimanapun, kaedah-kaedah tersebut berjalan buruk atau gagal sepenuhnya untuk pengguna suara yang kurang, yang mungkin telah menulis hanya beberapa tweet mengenai sasaran. In this paper, we tackle stance detection for such users using two approaches.  In the first approach, we improve user-level stance detection by representing tweets using contextualized embeddings, which capture latent meanings of words in context.  Kami menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan ini melampaui dua garis dasar yang kuat dan mencapai 89.6% keperluan dan 91.3% makro F-ukuran pada lapan topik kontroversi. Dalam pendekatan kedua, kami mengembangkan tweet pengguna tertentu menggunakan tweet garis masa Twitter mereka, yang mungkin tidak relevan secara topik, dan kemudian kami melakukan kelasukan pengguna yang tidak diawasi, yang mengandungi kelasukan pengguna dengan pengguna lain dalam set latihan. Pendekatan ini mencapai kepekatan 95.6% dan ukuran-F makro 93.1%.', 'ro': 'Detectarea poziției utilizatorului implică stabilirea poziției unui utilizator față de o țintă, cum ar fi o entitate, un subiect sau o revendicare. Lucrările recente care utilizează clasificarea nesupravegheată au arătat că detectarea poziției pe utilizatorii Twitter vocali, care au multe tweet-uri pe o țintă, poate fi foarte precisă (+98%). Cu toate acestea, astfel de metode funcționează prost sau eșuează complet pentru utilizatorii mai puțin vocali, care pot fi autor doar câteva tweet-uri despre o țintă. În această lucrare, abordăm detectarea poziției pentru astfel de utilizatori folosind două abordări. În prima abordare, îmbunătățim detectarea poziției la nivel de utilizator prin reprezentarea tweet-urilor folosind încorporări contextualizate, care capturează semnificațiile latente ale cuvintelor în context. Aratăm că această abordare depășește două linii de bază puternice și atinge o precizie de 89,6% și 91,3% macro F-măsură pe opt subiecte controversate. În cea de-a doua abordare, extindem tweeturile unui anumit utilizator folosind tweeturile lor din cronologie Twitter, care pot să nu fie relevante din punct de vedere topic, și apoi efectuăm clasificarea nesupravegheată a utilizatorului, ceea ce implică clusterizarea unui utilizator cu alți utilizatori în setul de instruire. Această abordare atinge o precizie de 95,6% și o măsură macro F de 93,1%.', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгч нөхцөл байдлыг олох нь хэрэглэгчийн нөхцөлийг зорилгоор тодорхойлж чаддаг. Шинэ хувилбаруудыг ашиглаж байгаа саяхан ажил нь дуу хоолойн Твиттер хэрэглэгчдийн байр сууриллагааг олон tweets хийж байгааг харуулсан байна. Гэвч ийм арга нь зорилгооны тухай хэд хэдэн tweets зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн хэдэн дуу хоолойн хэрэглэгчдийн хувьд буруу эсвэл бүтэлгүйтсэн. Энэ цаасан дээр бид ийм хэрэглэгчид хоёр арга зам ашиглаж байдаг байдлыг мэдэхэд зориулж байна. Эхний арга хэмжээнд бид хэрэглэгчийн түвшинд тодорхойлдог байдлыг сайжруулж, тодорхойлдог тодорхойлолтуудыг ашиглан бичлэгүүдийг илэрхийлдэг. Бид энэ аргыг хоёр хүчтэй суурь шугам гаргаж, 89.6% зөв, 91.3% макро F-хэмжээг найм эсрэг сэдэв дээр гаргаж байна. Хоёр дахь арга хэмжээнд бид Twitter цаг хугацааны tweets ашиглаж өгсөн хэрэглэгчийн tweets-г нэмэгдүүлсэн. Энэ нь сэдвээс хамааралтай байж магадгүй, дараа нь бид хэрэглэгчийн хуваалцаагүй хуваалцаа хийдэг. Энэ арга баримтууд 95.6% зөв болон 93.1% макро F-хэмжээтэй байдаг.', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje stanja korisnika uključuje potvrdu pozicije korisnika prema cilju, kao što je entitet, tema ili tvrdnja. Nedavni rad koji zapošljava nepotrebnu klasifikaciju pokazao je da otkrivanje stanja na glasnim korisnicima Twitter-a, koji imaju mnogo tweeta na cilju, može biti vrlo precizno (+98%). Međutim, takve metode čine loše ili ne uspevaju u potpunosti manjim glasnim korisnicima, koji su možda odobrili samo nekoliko tweeta o cilju. U ovom papiru, riješimo otkrivanje stanja za takve korisnike koristeći dva pristupa. U prvom pristupu, poboljšavamo otkrivanje stanja na nivou korisnika predstavljajući tweet koristeći kontekstualizovane integracije, koje uključuju latentne značenje riječi u kontekstu. Pokazujemo da taj pristup iznosi dve jake osnovne linije i postiže tačnost 89,6% i makro-F-mjera 91,3% na osam kontroverznih tema. U drugom pristupu, proširili smo tweet određenog korisnika koristeći njihove Twitter timeline tweets, koji možda nisu tematski relevantni, a onda izvedemo neodređenu klasifikaciju korisnika, koja uključuje skupljanje korisnika sa drugim korisnicima u setu obuke. Ovaj pristup postiže tačnost 95,6% i 93,1% makro F-mjere.', 'si': 'භාවිතා ස්ථානයක් හොයාගන්නේ ඉලක්කයක් පැත්තට ප්\u200dරයෝජකයේ ස්ථානය හොයාගන්න, හරියට අභිවිධානයක්, ව අලුත් වැඩේ වැඩ කරන්නේ නැති විශේෂණ විශේෂණයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ස්ථානය හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පෙන්වන්නේ  නමුත්, ඒ වගේ විද්\u200dයාවක් අවස්ථාවක් නැති විද්\u200dයාවක් නැති විද්\u200dයාවක් නැති විද්\u200dයාවක් නැති විද්\u200dයාවක් නැ මේ පැත්තට, අපි මේ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෝ ගැන හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් දෙකක් භාවිත කරනවා. පළමු ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෙන් ස්ථානයක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ට්විට් වලින් ප්\u200d අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ විදිහට බලාපොරොත්තු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනවා කියලා, 89.6% සැකසුම සහ 91.3% මැක්රෝ F-මාර දෙවෙනි විදියට, අපි දෙන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෙක්ගේ ට්විට් විස්තර කරනවා ඔවුන්ගේ ට්විටර් කාලින් ට්විට් භාවිත කරන්න, ඒක විදියට සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න බැරි වෙන මේ විදිහට 95.6% සැකසීම සහ 93.1% මැක්රෝ F- මාර්ගයක් ලැබෙනවා.', 'so': 'Aqoonshaha goobta isticmaaluhu waa in uu caddeeyaa meesha uu isticmaaluhu u jeedo goal, tusaale ahaan xarunta, mada ama codsiga. Shaqo la xiriira fasaxa aan la ilaalinayn wuxuu muujiyey in la caddeyn karo isticmaalayaasha codka ah ee Twitterka oo ay leeyihiin Twitteryo badan oo ku qoran waxey si sax ah u noqon karaan (+98%). Si kastaba ha ahaatee noocyada caynkaas ah waxay sameyn karaan miskiin ama aad u baaqan karto isticmaalayaasha cod ka yar, kuwaas oo suurtagal ah in ay warqad ku qoran marxalad yar. Qoraalkan waxaynu kula macaamiloonnaa aragtida joogista ee isticmaalayaasha isticmaalka laba qaab ah. Marka ugu horeysa, waxaynu kordhinnaa aqoonta heerka ee isticmaalayaasha Tweetka, kaas oo qabsada micnaheedii ugu dambeeyey ee hadalka. Waxaynu muujinnaa in dhaqdhaqaaqigu uu soo saaraa laba saldhig oo xoog leh, wuxuuna gaadhaa 89.6% saxda iyo 91.3% macro F-qiyaas oo ku saabsan siddeed mada muran. In the second approach, we expand the tweets of a given user using their Twitter timeline tweets, which may not be topically relevant, and then we perform unsupervised classification of the user, which entails clustering a user with other users in the training set.  Dhaqaalahan waxay gaadhaa 95.6 boqolkiiba saxda iyo 93.1 boqolkiiba macro F-measure.', 'sv': 'Identifiering av användarinställning innebär att fastställa användarens position gentemot ett mål, till exempel en enhet, ämne eller anspråk. Nyligen genomförda arbeten som använder en oövervakad klassificering har visat att det kan vara mycket exakt att utföra ställningsdetektering på vokala Twitter-användare, som har många tweets på ett mål (+98%). Sådana metoder fungerar dock dåligt eller misslyckas helt för mindre vokala användare, som kanske bara har skrivit några tweets om ett mål. I det här arbetet tar vi itu med positionsdetektering för sådana användare med hjälp av två tillvägagångssätt. I den första metoden förbättrar vi inställningen på användarnivå genom att representera tweets med hjälp av kontextualiserade inbäddningar, som fångar latenta betydelser av ord i kontext. Vi visar att detta tillvägagångssätt överträffar två starka baslinjer och uppnår 89,6% noggrannhet och 91,3% makro F-mått på åtta kontroversiella ämnen. I det andra tillvägagångssättet utökar vi en viss användares tweets med hjälp av deras Twitter tidslinjetweets, vilket kanske inte är aktuellt relevant, och sedan utför vi oövervakad klassificering av användaren, vilket innebär att en användare klustrar med andra användare i utbildningsuppsättningen. Detta tillvägagångssätt uppnår 95,6% noggrannhet och 93,1% makro F-mått.', 'mt': "User stance detection entails ascertaining the position of a user towards a target, such as an entity, topic, or claim.  Xogħol reċenti li jimpjega klassifikazzjoni mhux sorveljata wera li l-prestazzjoni tad-detezzjoni tal-pożizzjonijiet fuq utenti vokali ta’ Twitter, li għandhom ħafna tweets fuq mira, tista’ tkun preċiża ħafna (+98%). Madankollu, metodi bħal dawn iwettqu ħa żin jew ifallu kompletament għal utenti anqas vokali, li setgħu awtaw biss ftit tweets dwar mira. F’dan id-dokument, nindirizzaw id-detezzjoni tal-pożizzjonijiet għal dawn l-utenti bl-użu ta’ żewġ approċċi. Fl-ewwel approċċ, aħna ntejbu l-identifikazzjoni tal-pożizzjoni fil-livell tal-utent billi nirrappreżentaw tweets bl-użu ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet kuntestwalizzati, li jaqbdu tifsiriet moħbija ta’ kliem fil-kuntest. Aħna nuru li dan l-approċċ jaqbeż żewġ linji bażi b'saħħithom u jikseb preċiżjoni ta' 89.6% u miżura makro-F ta' 91.3% fuq tmien suġġetti kontroversjali. Fit-tieni approċċ, nispandu t-tweets ta’ utent partikolari bl-użu tat-tweets tagħhom fuq il-linji ta’ żmien Twitter, li jistgħu ma jkunux rilevanti topikament, u mbagħad nagħmlu klassifikazzjoni mhux sorveljata tal-utent, li tinvolvi l-raggruppament ta’ utent ma’ utenti oħra fis-sett tat-taħriġ. Dan l-approċċ jikseb preċiżjoni ta’ 95.6% u miżura makro-F ta’ 93.1%.", 'ta': 'ஒரு பொருள், தலைப்பு, அல்லது கோரிக்கை போன்ற பயனரின் நிலையை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் சமீபத்தில் பாதுகாப்பில்லாத வகுப்பாட்டை வேலை செய்யும் வெளிப்படையாகும் சொல்லுக்கான பயனர்களின் நிலையான கண்டுபிடிப்பை காட்டுகிறது,  எனினும், இத்தகைய முறைமைகள் தவறான அல்லது குறைந்த குரல் பயனர்களுக்கு முழுமையாக தோல்வியுறுகிறது, இலக்கு பற்றி சில சில த இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் இவ்வாறு பயனர்களுக்கு இரு வழிகளை பயன்படுத்தி நிலையான கண்டுபிடிப்பை பொருத்து முதல் வழியில், நாம் பயனர் நிலை கண்டுபிடிப்பை மேம்படுத்துகிறோம் கட்டுப்பாட்டுகளை பயன்படுத்தி தொடர்ந்து கொள்ளும் குறிப்பிட We show that this approach outperforms two strong baselines and achieves 89.6% accuracy and 91.3% macro F-measure on eight controversial topics.  இரண்டாவது முறையில், நாம் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட பயனரின் துவக்குகளை அவர்களுடைய Twitter நேரத்திற்கு பயன்படுத்தி விரிவாக்குகிறோம், அது மேலும் தொடர்பு இல்லாது, பின்னர் நாம் பயனரின் ப 95. 6% சரியாக பெறுகிறது மற்றும் 93. 1% மாக்ரோ F-அளவை பெறுகிறது.', 'ur': 'کارساز موقعیت شناسایی ایک کارساز کے موقعیت کو ایک موقعیت کی طرف پہچانتا ہے، جیسے ایک موقعیت، موضوع، یا ادعا. اچھا کام جو غیر قابل تعلیم کا کاروبار کرتا ہے دکھاتا ہے کہ آواز ٹویٹر کارساز کے ذریعے بہت سی ٹویٹ ہیں، بہت سی دقیق (+98%) ہو سکتی ہیں۔ However, such methods perform poorly or fail completely for less vocal users, who may have authorized only a few tweets about a target. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایسے کارساز کے لئے موقعیت شناسایی کا استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ پہلی طریقہ میں، ہم سویر-سطح کی موقعیت کا اظہار کریں، توئیٹ کو متوسط انبودینگ کے مطابق دکھاتے ہیں، جو کلمات کی لاٹینٹی معنی کو متوسط میں پکڑتے ہیں. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ طریقہ دو قوت بنسٹ لین سے کامل ہوتی ہے اور 89.6% دقیق ہوتی ہے اور 91.3% مکرو فی اندازہ آٹھ جھگڑالو موضوع پر حاصل ہوتی ہے. دوسرے طریقے میں، ہم نے اپنے ٹویٹر ٹائیٹ لین ٹویٹ کے مطابق ایک استعمال کے ٹیوٹ کو پھیلایا ہے، جو ممکن نہیں ہے، اور پھر ہم استعمال کے غیر قابل تعلیم کریں گے، جس میں دوسرے کارساز کے ساتھ استعمال کریں گے. یہ تقریبا 95.6% دقیق اور 93.1% مکرو F-اندازہ تک پہنچتا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Yaqinda xavob berilmagan darajalashtirilmagan ishni ko'rsatadi. Tovush foydalanuvchiga ko'pchilik Twitter foydalanuvchilarida foydalanuvchilarni aniqlash imkoniyatini koʻrsatish mumkin (+98%). Lekin, bu usullar yomon bajaradi yoki kam tovush foydalanuvchilarga ko'p ishlatish mumkin. Bu foydalanuvchilarga faqat bir necha tweeti huquqlarini amalga oshirish mumkin. Bu qogʻozda biz bu foydalanuvchilarga ikki usul bilan foydalanuvchilarga ishlab chiqaramiz. Birinchi usulda, biz foydalanuvchi darajasini aniqlash imkoniyatini bajaramiz. Biz xabarlarni taʼminlov qiladigan xabarlarni ishlatish mumkin. Biz shu usulni ko'rsatganimiz, bu ikki sterk asboblarni bajaradi va 89.6% tizimni aniqlaydi va 81.3% makro F-metrlarini sakkizta murakkab mavjud bilan amalga oshadi. Ikkinchi darajada, biz foydalanuvchidan foydalanuvchi Twitterning taymaviy Twitterdan foydalanuvchi Twitterdan foydalanuvchilarni ko'payapmiz, bu muhim emas emas, va keyin biz foydalanuvchiga xavfsiz qilmagan darajasini bajaramiz, bu ta'lim sohasida boshqa foydalanuvchilar bilan foydalanuvchilarni birlash Bu usul 95.6% аниқ ва 93.1% macro F- ўлчовга етади.", 'vi': 'Việc xác định vị trí của người dùng đối với mục tiêu, như thực thể, chủ đề, hay yêu cầu. Công việc gần đây có chế độ không giám sát cho thấy khả năng phát hiện lập trường trên người dùng giọng hát trên Twitter, người có nhiều tweet trên một mục tiêu, có thể rất chính xác. Tuy nhiên, các phương pháp này có tác dụng kém hay hoàn toàn thất bại đối với người dùng ít giọng nói, người mà có thể tạo ra chỉ vài dòng tweet về một mục tiêu. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi xử lý việc phát hiện lập trường cho những người đó bằng hai phương pháp. Trong phương pháp đầu tiên, chúng tôi nâng cao khả năng nhận diện trang web của người dùng bằng cách đại diện cho Twitter bằng cách nhập vào các tình huống, thu thập các ý nghĩa tiềm ẩn của từ ngữ ngữ cảnh. Chúng tôi cho thấy phương pháp này đạt được hai nền tảng vững chắc và đạt được độ chính xác 86. Trong cách tiếp cận thứ hai, chúng ta mở rộng các tweet của một người dùng dùng dùng dùng dòng thời gian trên Twitter, có thể không quan trọng về mặt chính xác, và sau đó chúng ta thực hiện phân loại người dùng không được giám sát, nghĩa là tập hợp người dùng với những người dùng khác trong bộ tập luyện. Phương pháp này đạt được mức độ chính xác 96.', 'da': 'Registrering af brugerholdning indebærer at fastslå en brugers position over for et mål, såsom en enhed, emne eller krav. Det seneste arbejde, der anvender uautoriseret klassificering, har vist, at udførelse af standdetektering på vokale Twitter-brugere, der har mange tweets på et mål, kan være meget nøjagtig (+98%). Men sådanne metoder fungerer dårligt eller fejler helt for mindre vokale brugere, der måske kun har skrevet et par tweets om et mål. I denne artikel tager vi fat på holdningsdetektering for sådanne brugere ved hjælp af to tilgange. I den første tilgang forbedrer vi positionsdetektering på brugerniveau ved at repræsentere tweets ved hjælp af kontekstualiserede indlejringer, som fanger latente betydninger af ord i kontekst. Vi viser, at denne tilgang overgår to stærke basislinjer og opnår 89,6% nøjagtighed og 91,3% makro F-måling på otte kontroversielle emner. I den anden fremgangsmåde udvider vi tweets fra en given bruger ved hjælp af deres Twitter tidslinje tweets, som måske ikke er aktuelt relevante, og derefter udfører vi ukontrolleret klassificering af brugeren, hvilket indebærer at klynge en bruger med andre brugere i træningssættet. Denne tilgang opnår 95,6% nøjagtighed og 93,1% makro F-måling.', 'bg': 'Откриването на позицията на потребителя включва установяване на позицията на потребителя спрямо дадена цел, като например субект, тема или претенция. Последна работа, която използва неподготвена класификация, показа, че извършването на откриване на позиции на вокални потребители на Туитър, които имат много туитове за мишена, може да бъде много точно (+98%). Въпреки това, такива методи се представят лошо или се провалят напълно за по-малко гласови потребители, които може да са написали само няколко туита за цел. В тази статия се занимаваме с откриването на позиции за такива потребители, използвайки два подхода. В първия подход подобряваме разпознаването на позицията на ниво потребител чрез представяне на туитове чрез контекстуализирани вграждания, които улавят латентните значения на думите в контекста. Показваме, че този подход превъзхожда две силни базови линии и постига 89,6% точност и 91,3% макро мярка по осем спорни теми. Във втория подход разширяваме туитовете на даден потребител, използвайки техните туитове във времевата линия на Туитър, които може да не са актуално актуални, и след това извършваме неоторизирана класификация на потребителя, което включва групиране на потребител с други потребители в комплекта от обучения. Този подход постига 95,6% точност и 93,1% макро мярка.', 'de': 'Die Erkennung der Nutzerposition beinhaltet die Ermittlung der Position eines Benutzers gegenüber einem Ziel, z. B. einer Entität, einem Thema oder einem Anspruch. Neuere Arbeiten, die eine unbeaufsichtigte Klassifizierung verwenden, haben gezeigt, dass die Positionserkennung bei stimmigen Twitter-Nutzern, die viele Tweets auf einem Ziel haben, sehr genau sein kann (+98%). Allerdings funktionieren solche Methoden schlecht oder scheitern vollständig für weniger stimmige Nutzer, die möglicherweise nur wenige Tweets über ein Ziel verfasst haben. In diesem Beitrag befassen wir uns mit der Positionserkennung für solche Benutzer mit zwei Ansätzen. Im ersten Ansatz verbessern wir die Positionserkennung auf Benutzerebene, indem wir Tweets mithilfe kontextualisierter Einbettungen darstellen, die latente Bedeutungen von Wörtern im Kontext erfassen. Wir zeigen, dass dieser Ansatz zwei starke Baselines übertrifft und 89,6% Genauigkeit und 91,3% Makro F-Maß bei acht kontroversen Themen erreicht. Im zweiten Ansatz erweitern wir die Tweets eines bestimmten Nutzers mithilfe seiner Twitter Timeline-Tweets, die möglicherweise nicht aktuell sind, und führen dann eine unbeaufsichtigte Klassifizierung des Nutzers durch, was bedeutet, einen Nutzer mit anderen Nutzern im Trainingsset zu clustern. Dieser Ansatz erreicht 95,6% Genauigkeit und 93,1% Makro F-Messung.', 'id': 'User stance detection entails ascertaining the position of a user towards a target, such as an entity, topic, or claim.  Recent work that employs unsupervised classification has shown that performing stance detection on vocal Twitter users, who have many tweets on a target, can be highly accurate (+98%).  However, such methods perform poorly or fail completely for less vocal users, who may have authored only a few tweets about a target.  In this paper, we tackle stance detection for such users using two approaches.  Dalam pendekatan pertama, kita meningkatkan deteksi posisi tingkat pengguna dengan mewakili tweet menggunakan embedding kontekstualisasi, yang menangkap makna rahasia kata-kata dalam konteks. Kami menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan ini melebihi dua garis dasar yang kuat dan mencapai 89,6% akurasi dan 91,3% makro F-ukuran pada delapan topik kontroversial. In the second approach, we expand the tweets of a given user using their Twitter timeline tweets, which may not be topically relevant, and then we perform unsupervised classification of the user, which entails clustering a user with other users in the training set.  This approach achieves 95.6% accuracy and 93.1% macro F-measure.', 'nl': 'Het detecteren van gebruikersstandpunten houdt in dat de positie van een gebruiker ten opzichte van een doel, zoals een entiteit, onderwerp of claim, wordt bepaald. Recent werk dat gebruik maakt van onbeheerde classificatie heeft aangetoond dat het uitvoeren van standdetectie bij vocale Twitter-gebruikers, die veel tweets op een doelwit hebben, zeer nauwkeurig kan zijn (+98%). Dergelijke methoden presteren echter slecht of falen volledig voor minder vocale gebruikers, die misschien slechts een paar tweets over een doel hebben geschreven. In dit artikel behandelen we standdetectie voor dergelijke gebruikers met behulp van twee benaderingen. In de eerste benadering verbeteren we de standdetectie op gebruikersniveau door tweets weer te geven met behulp van contextualiseerde embeddings, die latente betekenissen van woorden in context vastleggen. We laten zien dat deze aanpak beter presteert dan twee sterke baselines en bereikt 89,6% nauwkeurigheid en 91,3% macro F-meting op acht controversiële onderwerpen. In de tweede aanpak breiden we de tweets van een bepaalde gebruiker uit met behulp van hun Twitter tijdlijn tweets, die mogelijk niet actueel relevant zijn, en voeren we vervolgens een onbeheerde classificatie van de gebruiker uit, wat inhoudt dat een gebruiker wordt geclusterd met andere gebruikers in de trainingsset. Deze benadering bereikt 95,6% nauwkeurigheid en 93,1% macro F-meting.', 'ko': '사용자 자세 검사는 실체, 테마, 성명 등 사용자가 목표에 대한 위치를 확정해야 한다.최근 무감독 분류 작업에 따르면 유성 트위터 사용자(이들은 한 목표에 많은 트윗을 올리고 있다)에 대한 자세 측정이 매우 정확하다(+98%).그러나 소리가 비교적 작은 사용자에게 이런 방법의 성능은 매우 나쁘거나 완전히 실패했다. 왜냐하면 그들은 목표에 관한 몇 개의 추문만 썼을 수 있기 때문이다.본고에서 우리는 두 가지 방법을 사용하여 이런 사용자의 자세 검측 문제를 해결한다.첫 번째 방법에서 우리는 상하문 삽입을 사용하여 추문을 표시함으로써 사용자급의 입장 검측을 개선했다. 이 삽입은 상하문에 있는 단어의 잠재적인 의미를 포착했다.우리는 이러한 방법이 두 개의 강기선보다 우수하다는 것을 증명했고 8개의 쟁의가 있는 주제에서 89.6%의 정확도와 91.3%의 거시적 F-도량을 실현했다.두 번째 방법에서 우리는 사용자에게 주어진 트위터 타임라인 트윗을 사용하여 트윗을 확장한다. 이것은 주제와 무관할 수 있다. 그리고 우리는 사용자에게 무감독 분류를 실시한다. 이것은 사용자와 교육이 집중된 다른 사용자를 분류해야 한다.이 방법은 95.6%의 정확도와 93.1%의 거시F-측정을 실현했다.', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje stanja korisnika uključuje utvrđivanje pozicije korisnika prema cilju, poput entiteta, teme ili tvrdnje. Posljednji rad koji zapošljava nepotrebnu klasifikaciju pokazao je da otkrivanje stanja na glasnim korisnicima Twitter-a koji imaju mnogo tweeta na cilju može biti vrlo precizno (+98%). Međutim, takve metode čine loše ili neuspješno za manje glasnih korisnika, koji su možda odobrili samo nekoliko tweeta o cilju. U ovom papiru rješavamo otkrivanje stanja za takve korisnike koristeći dva pristupa. U prvom pristupu, poboljšavamo otkrivanje stanja na razini korisnika, predstavljajući tweet korištenjem kontekstualiziranih integracija, koje uključuju latentne značenje riječi u kontekstu. Pokazujemo da taj pristup iznosi dvije jake osnovne linije i postiže tačnost 89,6% i makro F-mjera 91,3% na osam kontroverznim temama. U drugom pristupu, proširili smo tweets određenog korisnika koristeći njihove Twitter timeline tweets, koje možda nisu temeljno relevantne, a onda ćemo izvršiti neodređenu klasifikaciju korisnika, koja uključuje skupljanje korisnika sa drugim korisnicima u setu obuke. Ovaj pristup postiže tačnost 95,6% i mjerenje makro F-a 93,1%.', 'af': "Gebruikersstansie beskrywing beteken die posisie van 'n gebruiker na 'n doel, soos 'n entiteit, onderwerp, of aanvra. Onlangse werk wat onverondersteunde klasifikasie gebruik het, het vertoon dat die uitvoerde staanse beskrywing op voël Twitter gebruikers, wat baie tweets op 'n doel het, baie presies (+98%) kan wees. Maar sodanige metodes uitvoer sleg of misluk heeltemal vir minder stem gebruikers, wat dalk dalk net 'n paar tweets oor 'n doel gehoort het. In hierdie papier is ons die staatsonderskrywing van sodanige gebruikers met twee toegang. In die eerste toegang, verbeter ons gebruiker-vlak-staanse beskrywing deur tweets te verteenwoordig deur konteksualiseerde inbêding te gebruik, wat latente betekenings van woorde in konteks opvang. Ons wys dat hierdie toegang twee sterke basisline uitvoer en 89.6% waarskynlik en 91.3% makro F-maat op agt kontroversiewe onderwerpe bereik. In die tweede toegang het ons die tweete van 'n gegewe gebruiker uitbrei deur hulle Twitter tydline tweets te gebruik, wat dalk mag nie onderwerp benodig wees nie, en dan uitvoer ons ononderwerp klasifikasie van die gebruiker, wat bedoel om 'n gebruiker met ander gebruikers in die onderwerp stel te sluit. Hierdie toegang bereik 95. 6% presies en 93. 1% makro F- maat.", 'sw': 'Ugunduzi wa msimamo wa mtumiaji unahitaji kutambua nafasi ya mtumiaji kwa lengo, kama vile entity, mada, au mada. Kazi za hivi karibuni ambazo hutumia sifa zisizo na uhakika imeonyesha kuwa kutekeleza msimamo mkali kwa watumiaji wa mtandao wa Twita, ambao wana twiti nyingi kwa lengo hilo, inaweza kuwa sahihi sana (+98%). Hata hivyo, mbinu hizo zinafanya vibaya au kushindwa kabisa kwa watumiaji wa sauti ndogo, ambao wanaweza kuandika twiti chache kuhusu lengo hilo. Katika gazeti hili, tunakabiliana na utambuzi wa msimamo kwa watumiaji wa aina hiyo kwa kutumia njia mbili. Katika hatua ya kwanza, tunaboresha mtazamo wa kiwango cha mtumiaji kwa kuwawakilisha twiti kwa kutumia vifaa vinavyoendelea, ambavyo vinakumbua maana ya hivi karibuni ya maneno katika muktadha. We show that this approach outperforms two strong baselines and achieves 89.6% accuracy and 91.3% macro F-measure on eight controversial topics.  Katika mbinu ya pili, tunapandisha twiti za mtumiaji aliyepewa kwa kutumia twiti zao za mtandao wa Twita, ambazo inaweza kuwa si jambo la muhimu sana, na kisha tunafanya usambazaji usio na uhakika wa mtumiaji, ambalo linamaanisha kuwaunganisha mtumiaji na watumiaji wengine katika seti ya mafunzo. Hatua hii inafikia asilimia 95.6 ya uhakika na asilimia 93.1 ya ukurasa wa F.', 'sq': 'Zbulimi i qëndrimit të përdoruesit përfshin sigurimin e pozicionit të një përdoruesi drejt një objekti, të tillë si një njësi, temë apo pretendim. Puna e fundit që punon klasifikimin e pa mbikqyrur ka treguar se kryerja e zbulimit të qëndrimeve në përdoruesit e Twitterit vokal, që kanë shumë tweete në një objektiv, mund të jetë shumë e saktë (+98%). However, such methods perform poorly or fail completely for less vocal users, who may have authored only a few tweets about a target.  In this paper, we tackle stance detection for such users using two approaches.  In the first approach, we improve user-level stance detection by representing tweets using contextualized embeddings, which capture latent meanings of words in context.  We show that this approach outperforms two strong baselines and achieves 89.6% accuracy and 91.3% macro F-measure on eight controversial topics.  In the second approach, we expand the tweets of a given user using their Twitter timeline tweets, which may not be topically relevant, and then we perform unsupervised classification of the user, which entails clustering a user with other users in the training set.  This approach achieves 95.6% accuracy and 93.1% macro F-measure.', 'am': 'የተጠቃሚ ስህተት ማግኘት፣ አካል፣ ጉዳዩ ወይም ጥያቄ እንዲመስል የተጠቃሚ ተጠቃሚ ስፍራን ማረጋገጥ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ የማይጠበቀው መፍለጋት የሚሠራው ሥራ የድምፅ ትዊተር ተጠቃሚዎች ላይ የድምፅ ግንኙነት አግኝቷል፡፡ However, such methods perform poorly or fail completely for less vocal users, who may have authored only a few tweets about a target.  በዚህ ጋዜጠኛ ውስጥ ሁለት ደረጃዎች ለመጠቀም ለዚህ ተጠቃሚዎች የሁኔታ ግንኙነትን እናቃጥላለን፡፡ በመጀመሪያው ደረጃዎች፣ የጠቃሚ ደረጃ ግንኙነትን በመጠቀም በተቃውሞ የቃላትን አስተያየት በመጠቀም እናሳድጋለን፡፡ ይህም ሥርዓት ሁለት ብርቱ መሠረቶች እንዲያሳየው እና 89.6 በመቶ እርግጠኛ እና 91.3 በመቶ ማክሮ F-ሚዛን በስምንት ተከራካሪዎቹ ጉዳዮች ላይ እንዲደርስ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ በሁለተኛው ሥርዓት፣ የተሰጠውን የተጠቃሚ የTwitter ትዊተሮችን በትዊተር ላይ የሚጠያየቁ አይደሉም፡፡ ይህም ሥርዓት 95.6 በመቶ እርግጠኛ እና 93.1 በመቶ ማክሮ F-መስፈሪያ ያገኛል።', 'hy': 'User stance detection entails ascertaining the position of a user towards a target, such as an entity, topic, or claim.  Recent work that employs unsupervised classification has shown that performing stance detection on vocal Twitter users, who have many tweets on a target, can be highly accurate (+98%).  However, such methods perform poorly or fail completely for less vocal users, who may have authored only a few tweets about a target.  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք վերաբերվում ենք դիրքի հայտնաբերմանը նման օգտագործողների համար, օգտագործելով երկու մոտեցում: Առաջին մոտեցումներում մենք բարելավում ենք օգտագործողի մակարդակի դիրքի հայտնաբերումը՝ ներկայացնելով թվիթերն օգտագործելով կոնտեքստիալ ներդրումներ, որոնք ներկայացնում են բառերի թաքնված իմաստը կոնտեքստում: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս մոտեցումը գերազանցում է երկու ուժեղ հիմնական գծեր և հասնում է 89.6 տոկոսի ճշգրտության և 91.3 տոկոսի մակրոֆ-չափության ութ հակառակ թեմաների վրա: Երկրորդ մոտեցումներում մենք ընդլայնում ենք տվյալ օգտագործողի թվիթերը օգտագործելով իրենց Թվիթերի ժամանակային թվիթերը, ինչը թեմայորեն կարևոր չէ, և հետո մենք կատարում ենք օգտագործողի անվերահսկված դասակարգման, ինչը նշանակում է, որ օգտագործողը դասակարգվում է այլ օգտագործողների հետ մարզի This approach achieves 95.6% accuracy and 93.1% macro F-measure.', 'fa': 'شناسایی موقعیت کاربر به عنوان موقعیت یک کاربر به سمت هدف، مانند یک عنوان، موضوع، یا ادعا می\u200cکند. کارهای اخیرا که از کلیسازی غیرقابل تحریک استفاده می\u200cکند نشان داده است که کشف موقعیت اجرای موقعیت روی کاربران توئیتر صوتی که توئیت\u200cهای زیادی روی هدف دارند، می\u200cتوانند بسیار دقیق باشند (+98%). با این حال، این روش\u200cها کاملاً برای کاربران صوتی کمتر ناکام انجام می\u200cدهند یا ناکام می\u200cشوند، که می\u200cتوانند فقط چند تا تویت درباره یک هدف را اجازه دهند. در این کاغذ، ما با استفاده از دو دسترسی با تشخیص موقعیت برای این کاربر استفاده می کنیم. در اولین دستور، ما با توجه کردن توئیت\u200cها با استفاده از انجمن\u200cهای متوسط، که معنی\u200cهای اخیر کلمات را در محیط می\u200cگیرند، بهتر می\u200cکنیم. ما نشان می دهیم که این روش دو خط بنیادی قوی را انجام می دهد و دقیق 89.6 درصد و 91.3 درصد ماکرو F-اندازه را در هشت موضوع متحد می رساند. در روش دوم، تویتهای یک کاربر داده شده را با استفاده از تویتهای زمان خط توئیتر خود گسترش دادیم، که ممکن است به عنوان موضوع مربوط نباشد، و سپس ما کلیتهای غیرقابل تحریک از کاربر را انجام می دهیم، که شامل جمع کردن یک کاربر با کاربر دیگر در مجموعه آموزش است. این روش دقیق ۹۵.۶ درصد و ۹۳.۱ درصد ماکرو فی پیمانه می\u200cرسد.', 'tr': 'Ullançy meýdançasynyň maksady, jisim, meýdança ýa-da iddia ýaly ullançy ýerini tanyşdyrmak mümkin edýär. Ýakynda ýakynlanmadyk klasifikasyny ulanan işleriň sesli Twitter ullançylarynda birnäçe tweetler bar, birnäçe hedefde gaty dogry bolup biler (+98%) görkezilýändigini görkezildi. Ýöne şol ýagdaýlar soňra ýalňyş ýola ýa-da az sesli ullançylar üçin boşadylýar. Olar bir maksadyň hakynda diňe birnäçe tweet hakynda hakykatdan sorap bilýärler. Bu kagyzda, biz bu ýaly ulanylaryň iki golaýy ulanyp barlag çykyp barýarys. Ilkinji ýagdaýda Ullançylaryň derejesi hasaplamak üçin tweets edilen çykyşlaryny görkezýäris. Bu ýagdaýda soňky sözlerin näme meselelerini daşyrýar. Biz bu ýalaýyş iki güýçli temel hatlaryň üstünden çykýandygyny görkeýäris we 89.6% dogrylygyny we 91.3% makro-ölçüsi sekiz müteahhat temalarda ýetip barýarys. Ikinji ýagdaýda, berilen bir ulançyň tweets-lerini Twitter zamanly tweets ullanýarys. Ol meňzeşligi ýok bolup biler, soňra ulançylaryň klasifikasyny etmäge meňzeş edýäris we bu sistemada başga ullançylar bilen meňzeş Ulaşçylary birleşirýäris. Bu ýalaşyk 95,6% dogrudylygy we 93,1% Makro F-Ölçüsi bardyr.', 'bn': 'User stance detection entails ascertaining the position of a user towards a target, such as an entity, topic, or claim.  সাম্প্রতিক কাজ যা অরক্ষিত শ্রেণীকরণ কাজ করে তা দেখিয়েছে যে ভোট টুইটার ব্যবহারকারীদের উপর অবস্থান সনাক্ত করা হয়েছে, যাদের লক্ষ্যে অনেক টুইট রয়েছে, তারা  তবে এই ধরনের পদ্ধতি খারাপ বা কম ভোট ব্যবহারকারীদের জন্য ব্যর্থ হয়, যারা শুধুমাত্র লক্ষ্যের ব্যাপারে কিছু টুইট লেখা পা এই পত্রিকায় আমরা এই ধরনের ব্যবহারকারীদের জন্য স্থানীয় আবিষ্কারের সাথে যুক্ত করি। প্রথম পদক্ষেপে আমরা ব্যবহারকারী স্তরের অবস্থানের পরিবর্তনের মাধ্যমে টুইটের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করে টুইটের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করি, যা সাম্প্রতিক ক আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই প্রতিযোগিতা দুটি শক্তিশালী বেসারেন্ট করে এবং ৮৯. ৬% সঠিকভাবে অর্জন করে এবং ৮টি বিতর্কিত বিষয়ে ৯১. দ্বিতীয় ক্ষেত্রে আমরা তাদের টুইটার টুইট ব্যবহার করে প্রযুক্ত একজন ব্যবহারকারীর টুইট ব্যবহার করেছি, যা সম্ভবত ব্যাপারে সংশ্লিষ্ট নয়, আর তারপর আমরা ব্যবহারকারীর অরক্ষিত ব্যবহারকার এই পদ্ধতি ৯৫. ৬% সঠিকভাবে অর্জন করে এবং ৯৩.', 'az': 'İstifadəçi tərzini keşfetmək istifadəçinin məqsədini, məsələsi, ya da məsələsi kimi istifadəçinin məqsədilə təsdiqləməsini təsdiqləyən məsələdir. Yaxınlıqla müəyyən edilməmiş klasifikasyonu istifadə edən yeni işlər, səs Twitter istifadəçilərinin istifadəçilərində bir çox twet sahibi olduğuna görə çox doğru olar (+98%). Lakin bu metodlar, həqiqətən də, məqsəd haqqında az səs istifadəçiləri üçün çox pis və ya müvəffəqiyyət edirlər. Bu kağızda, bu istifadəçilərə iki yaxınlıq vasitəsilə istifadəçilik etməyi çəkirik. İlk tərzdə, istifadəçilərin səviyyəsini təşkil etmək üçün, müxtəlif təşkil edilmiş məsələləri istifadə edərək twetləri təşkil edərək, sözlərin sonrakı anlamını məlumatlarına qoyur. Biz bu tərzim iki güclü temel çətinliklərdən üstün olduğunu göstəririk və 89,6% ədaləti və 91,3% makro F-ölçüsini sekiz mübahisə məsələlərdə yetiririk. İkinci tərzdə, Twitter zamanlı tweetlərini istifadə edərək verilən istifadəçin in tweetlərini genişləşdirirdik. Bu məsələdə məxluqatlı olmayabilir və sonra istifadəçinin müəyyən edilməsi üçün istifadəçi ilə başqa istifadəçilərlə birlikdə istifadəçi olmasını təmin edirik. Bu tərzim 95,6% ədaləti və 93,1% makro F ölçüsünü başa düşər.', 'et': 'Kasutaja seisukoha tuvastamine tähendab kasutaja positsiooni kindlakstegemist sihtmärgi, näiteks üksuse, teema või nõude suhtes. Hiljutised tööd, mis kasutavad järelevalveta klassifikatsiooni, on näidanud, et asendituvastuse tegemine häälekasutajatele Twitteris, kellel on sihtmärgi kohta palju säutseid, võib olla väga täpne (+98%). Kuid sellised meetodid toimivad halvasti või ebaõnnestuvad täielikult vähem häälekasutajate jaoks, kes võivad olla sihtmärgi kohta kirjutanud vaid mõned säutsud. Käesolevas dokumendis käsitleme selliste kasutajate seisaku tuvastamist kahe lähenemisviisi abil. Esimeses lähenemisviisis parandame kasutajatasemel seisukohtade tuvastamist, esitades säutsud kontekstipõhiste manustamiste abil, mis jäädvustavad sõnade latentsed tähendused kontekstis. Näitame, et see lähenemisviis ületab kahte tugevat lähtejoont ning saavutab 89,6% täpsuse ja 91,3% makro F-meetme kaheksas vastuolulises teemas. Teises lähenemisviisis laiendame konkreetse kasutaja säutseid, kasutades nende Twitteri ajajoone säutseid, mis ei pruugi olla aktuaalselt asjakohased, ja seejärel teostame kasutaja järelevalveta liigitamist, mis tähendab kasutaja klastristamist teiste kasutajatega koolituskomplektis. Selline lähenemisviis saavutab 95,6% täpsuse ja 93,1% makro F-mõõdu.', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje stanja korisnika uključuje utvrđivanje pozicije korisnika prema cilju, kao što je entitet, tema ili tvrdnja. Nedavni rad koji zapošljava neodređenu klasifikaciju pokazao je da otkrivanje stavova na glasnim korisnicima Twitter-a, koji imaju mnogo tweeta na cilju, može biti vrlo precizno (+98%). Međutim, takve metode čine loše ili ne uspevaju u potpunosti manjim glasnim korisnicima, koji su možda odobrili samo nekoliko tweeta o cilju. U ovom papiru, riješimo otkrivanje stanja za takve korisnike koristeći dva pristupa. U prvom pristupu, poboljšavamo otkrivanje stanja na nivou korisnika, predstavljajući tweete koristeći kontekstualizirane integracije, koje uključuju latentne značenje riječi u kontekstu. Pokazujemo da taj pristup iznosi dvije jake osnovne linije i postiže tačnost 89,6% i makro F-mjera 91,3% na osam kontroverznim temama. U drugom pristupu, proširili smo tweet određenog korisnika koristeći njihove Twitter timeline tweets, koje možda nisu temeljno relevantne, a onda ćemo izvršiti neodređenu klasifikaciju korisnika, koja uključuje skupljanje korisnika sa drugim korisnicima u setu obuke. Ovaj pristup postiže tačnost 95,6% i 93,1% makro F-mjere.', 'fi': 'Käyttäjäasennon havaitseminen edellyttää käyttäjän aseman määrittämistä kohteeseen, kuten kokonaisuuteen, aiheeseen tai vaatimukseen nähden. Viimeaikaiset tutkimukset, joissa käytetään valvomatonta luokittelua, ovat osoittaneet, että asennon havaitseminen Twitterin äänikäyttäjillä, joilla on useita twiittejä kohteesta, voi olla erittäin tarkkaa (+98%). Tällaiset menetelmät toimivat kuitenkin huonosti tai epäonnistuvat täysin vähemmän äänikäyttäjille, jotka ovat saattaneet kirjoittaa vain muutaman twiitin kohteesta. Tässä artikkelissa käsittelemme tällaisten käyttäjien asennon havaitsemista kahdella lähestymistavalla. Ensimmäisessä lähestymistavassa parannamme käyttäjätason asennon tunnistusta esittämällä twiittejä kontekstualisoitujen upotusten avulla, jotka tallentavat sanojen piilevät merkitykset kontekstissa. Osoitamme, että tämä lähestymistapa ylittää kaksi vahvaa perusviivaa ja saavuttaa 89,6%:n tarkkuuden ja 91,3%:n makrotason F-mittarin kahdeksassa kiistanalaisessa aiheessa. Toisessa lähestymistavassa laajennamme tietyn käyttäjän twiittejä Twitterin aikajanan twiitteillä, jotka eivät välttämättä ole ajankohtaisia, ja sitten suoritamme valvomattoman käyttäjän luokittelun, joka edellyttää käyttäjän klusterointia muiden koulutusjoukon käyttäjien kanssa. Tällä lähestymistavalla saavutetaan 95,6%:n tarkkuus ja 93,1%:n makro F-mitta.', 'ca': "La detecció de la posició de l'usuari implica verificar la posició d'un usuari cap a un objectiu, com una entitat, tema o reclamació. La feina recent que emprega una classificació no supervisada ha demostrat que la detecció de posicions dels usuaris vocals de Twitter, que tenen molts tweets sobre un objectiu, pot ser molt precisa (+98%). No obstant això, aquests mètodes es produeixen malament o fracassen completament per a menys usuaris vocals, que només podrien haver escrit alguns tweets sobre un objectiu. En aquest paper, tractem la detecció de posicions per aquests usuaris fent servir dos enfocaments. In the first approach, we improve user-level stance detection by representing tweets using contextualized embeddings, which capture latent meanings of words in context.  Mostrem que aquest enfocament supera dues línies de base fortes i aconsegueix una precisió del 89,6% i una macromesura del 91,3% en vuit temes controvertits. En el segon enfocament, expandim els tweets d'un usuari mitjançant els seus tweets a Twitter, que potser no són tòpicament rellevants, i després fem una classificació no supervisada del usuari, que implica agrupar un usuari amb altres usuaris en el conjunt d'entrenaments. This approach achieves 95.6% accuracy and 93.1% macro F-measure.", 'cs': 'Detekce postojů uživatele zahrnuje zjištění pozice uživatele vůči cíli, jako je entita, téma nebo nárok. Nedávná práce využívající klasifikaci bez dohledu ukázala, že detekce postojů u hlasních uživatelů Twitteru, kteří mají na cíli mnoho tweetů, může být vysoce přesná (+98%). Nicméně, takové metody fungují špatně nebo úplně selžou pro méně hlasité uživatele, kteří mohli napsat jen několik tweetů o cíli. V tomto článku se zabýváme detekcí postojů pro takové uživatele pomocí dvou přístupů. V prvním přístupu zlepšujeme detekci postojů na uživatelské úrovni reprezentací tweetů pomocí kontextualizovaných vložení, které zachycují latentní významy slov v kontextu. Ukazujeme, že tento přístup překonává dvě silné základní linie a dosahuje 89,6% přesnosti a 91,3% makro F-měření u osmi kontroverzních témat. Ve druhém přístupu rozšiřujeme tweety daného uživatele pomocí jeho tweetů na časové ose Twitteru, které nemusí být aktuálně relevantní, a pak provádíme bez dohledu klasifikaci uživatele, což znamená shlukování uživatele s ostatními uživateli v školicí sadě. Tento přístup dosahuje 95,6% přesnosti a 93,1% makro F-měření.', 'jv': 'Coverage tab politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang mapun iki, awake dhewe nglanggar sampek kanggo masalah iki dadi. Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan, kita nglanggar nggawe geraksi kuwi nggunakake tuat iki oleh basa gambar aturan contextual, kié sumulakno akeh sabên kelangan langgar sampek. Awak dhéwé ngerasakno ngono diangkat iki luwih dumadhi sing nggawe lan luwih-luwih sabané awak dhéwé, lan basa 9.6% kedhah nêmêr, lan 9.3% kedhah macro F-menyang sabanjuré tempak sing wis werak gawe Nang halok sekondi, kita mudhaya tuwitan kanggo nyelehake nggawe tuwitan nyelehke Tuytir timeline, sing bisa nggawe barang kelas bersatu, lan nguasai sak dhéwé ngerasakno sistem sing ora nggawe kudu nggo ngerasakno, kudu winih dhéwé tau nguasai sistem sing gawe nguasai pengguna ora nggawe kudu podho tau nggawe Metiné iki dadi, cah-cah 9.6% sampek lan 3.1% macro F-sampek.', 'ha': "Zani gane wurin da mai amfani da amfani da shi yana son ya gane wurin mai amfani da shi zuwa wata goa, kamar wani abu, madaidaici, ko yana madaidaita. Recent work that employs unsupervised classification has shown that performing stance detection on vocal Twitter users, who have many tweets on a target, can be highly accurate (+98%).  A lokacin da, waɗannan hanyoyin su sami misahan ko kuma su yi ɓarna kamma ga masu amfani da sauti kaɗan, waɗancan sun yi yarda da su kaɗan kawai da wato guda akan goan. Ga wannan takardan, Munã haɗa ganin stance wa masu amfani da waɗannan masu amfani da matsayi biyu. Daga na farkon hanyarwa, za mu ƙara bayani ga fassarar-leveli na amfani da wato biyu da za'a yi amfani da bakwai masu haɗuwa, wanda ke sami fassarar maganar nan da ke cikin muhimmada. Tuna nũna cewa wannan hanyarwa yana samar da bakin biyu mai ƙarfi kuma yana sãmu 89.6% tabbatacce da 91.3% macro F-balanci kan madaidaici takwas. Ga hanyarwa na biyu, za mu buɗe Twitter na wani mai amfani da shi da ke amfani da watumin tare-Twitter, wanda ba ya iya da amfani da shi ba, yana kasancẽwa mai da amfani da shi, kuma sa'an nan kuma za mu yi aikin classifar da wanda ba'a tsare ba, da shi yana ƙara wa mai amfani da wasu masu amfani da shi cikin tsarin mafarin. Wannan hanyor ya sami tsarin 95.6 kuma %macro F-metode 93.1.", 'bo': 'སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་བཤད་ནི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དམིགས དབྱེ་སྟངས་དཀའ་ངལ་མེད་པའི་བཟོ་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་ལས་སྤྱོད་པའི་ལས་འགའ་བའི་དབྱེ་རིགས་ཀྱིས་མཐོང་ནི་བརྡ་གཏོང་གི་ཨིན་ཌིས་ཡོད།ཁོང་ཚོའི་བརྡ་ ཡིན་ནའང་། འདི་དག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་དུ་སྐྱུར་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་ཉུང་བའི་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཚོར་ལས་ནུས་མེད་པ་དང་བརྗོད་སྤྱོད་མཁ འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་མཁན་ཚོས་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་བེད་སྤྱོད་པའི་གྲངས་སུ་བསམ་ འདྲི་ཚིག་དང་པོ་ནས་བྱ་རིམ་དང་ཐོག་མའི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རྟགས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བཅོས་པ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཐབས་ལམ་འདིའི་གཟུགས་རིས་གཞི་རྩིས་གཞི་གཉིས་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ་དང་89.6% ཐོག་ཙམ་སྒྲིལ་བ་དང་91.3% ཐོག འདྲི་ཚིག་གཉིས་པ་དེ། ང་ཚོས་བྱས་པའི་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཞིག་གི་tweets་འདི་རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་ཡོད། འདིས་གཟུགས་འགྲོ་བ་དེ་ཚོར་མཐའ་ཚད་95.6% དང་མཐའ་ཚད་93.1%.', 'sk': 'Zaznavanje položaja uporabnika vključuje ugotavljanje položaja uporabnika do cilja, kot je subjekt, tema ali trditev. Nedavno delo, ki uporablja nenadzorovano klasifikacijo, je pokazalo, da je lahko izvajanje zaznavanja položaja pri vokalnih uporabnikih Twitterja, ki imajo veliko tweetov na tarči, zelo natančno (+98%). Vendar pa takšne metode delujejo slabo ali popolnoma neuspešno za manj uporabnike glasov, ki so morda avtorji le nekaj tweetov o cilju. V tem prispevku se ukvarjamo z zaznavanjem položaja takšnih uporabnikov z dvema pristopoma. V prvem pristopu izboljšamo zaznavanje položaja na ravni uporabnika s predstavitvijo tweetov z uporabo kontekstualiziranih vdelav, ki zajemajo latentne pomene besed v kontekstu. Pokazali smo, da ta pristop presega dve močni osnovni liniji in dosega 89,6-odstotno natančnost in 91,3-odstotno makro F-merilo pri osmih kontroverznih temah. V drugem pristopu razširimo tweete določenega uporabnika z njegovimi tweeti časovnice Twitterja, ki morda niso aktualno relevantni, nato pa izvajamo neobzorovano klasifikacijo uporabnika, kar vključuje združevanje uporabnika z drugimi uporabniki v naboru usposabljanj. Ta pristop dosega 95,6-odstotno natančnost in 93,1-odstotno makro F-merilo.', 'he': 'זיהוי עמדת המשתמש כולל לבדוק את עמדת המשתמש כלפי מטרה, כמו ישות, נושא או טענה. העבודה האחרונה שמעסקת מסווג בלתי משגיח הראה כי ביצוע זיהוי עמדה על משתמשים קוליים של טוויטר, שיש להם הרבה טוויטרים על מטרה, יכול להיות מדויק מאוד (+98%). עם זאת, שיטות כאלה מבצעות גרועות או נכשלות לחלוטין עבור משתמשים פחות קוליים, שאולי הסתיימו רק כמה טוויטים על מטרה. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתמודדים עם זיהוי עמדה עבור משתמשים כאלה באמצעות שתי גישות. באמצעות הגישה הראשונה, אנחנו משתפרים את זיהוי עמדה ברמה המשתמש על ידי מייצג טוויטים באמצעות תוכניות קונטוקטוליזציות, שמתפסות משמעות מוסתרות של מילים בקשר. אנו מראים שהגישה הזאת עולה על שתי קווי בסיס חזקים ושיגה מדויקת 89.6% ו-91.3% מקרו-F על שמונה נושאים מתווכחים. באמצעות הגישה השנייה, אנו מרחיבים את הטוויטים של משתמש מסוים באמצעות הטוויטים שלהם בשורת הזמן, שאולי לא רלוונטיים באופן נושאי, ואז אנו מבצעים מסווג ללא השגחה של המשתמש, מה שמכריח להצמיד משתמש עם משתמשים אחרים בסט האימונים. הגישה הזו משיגה מדויקת 95.6% ו-93.1% מקרו F-מדידה.'}
{'en': 'Do Syntax Trees Help Pre-trained Transformers Extract Information?', 'ar': 'هل تساعد الأشجار التركيبية المحولات المدربة مسبقًا على استخراج المعلومات؟', 'pt': 'As árvores de sintaxe ajudam os transformadores pré-treinados a extrair informações?', 'es': '¿Los árboles de sintaxis ayudan a los transformadores preformados a extraer información', 'fr': 'Les arbres syntaxiques aident-ils les transformateurs préformés à extraire', 'ja': '構文木は、事前にトレーニングを受けたトランスフォーマーが情報を抽出するのに役立ちますか？', 'zh': '语法树岂有助于豫练者转换器取信?', 'hi': 'क्या सिंटैक्स पेड़ पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित ट्रांसफॉर्मर जानकारी निकालने में मदद करते हैं?', 'ru': 'Помогают ли синтаксические деревья предварительно обученным трансформаторам извлекать информацию?', 'ga': 'An Cuidíonn Crainn Chomhréire le Claochladáin Réamhoilte Eolas a Bhaint?', 'ka': 'სინტექსტის ხე დახმარება სამუშაო ტრანფიგურაციის გამოყენება ინფორმაცია?', 'hu': 'Segítenek-e a szintaxisfák az előképzett transzformátoroknak információk kivonásában?', 'el': 'Τα Δέντρα Συντάξεων βοηθούν τους Προπαιδευμένους μετασχηματιστές να εξάγουν πληροφορίες;', 'it': 'Gli alberi sintassi aiutano i trasformatori pre-addestrati a estrarre informazioni?', 'kk': 'Синтаксис бұтақтардың алдындағы түрлендірушілерінің алдындағы мәліметін тарқатуы керек пе?', 'ml': 'Do Syntax Trees Help Pre-trained Transformers Extract Information?', 'ms': 'Adakah Pohon Sintaks membantu Penukar Terlatih Menekstrak Maklumat?', 'mt': 'Is-Siġar tas-Sintassi jgħin lit-Trasformatituri mħarrġa minn qabel jestrezzjonaw l-informazzjoni?', 'mn': 'Синтаксис мод сургалтын өмнө сургалтын шилжүүлэгчид мэдээллийг татаж өгөх үү?', 'no': 'Er du sikker på å pakka ut informasjon ved hjelp av syntakstrår?', 'lt': 'Ar sintaksiniai medžiai padeda iš anksto apmokytiems transformatoriams ekstraktuoti informaciją?', 'pl': 'Czy drzewa syntaxowe pomagają wstępnie przeszkolonym transformatorom w wydobyciu informacji?', 'mk': 'Дали синтаксичните дрвја им помагаат на преобучените трансформирачи да извадат информации?', 'ro': 'Copacii sintaxiali ajută transformatorii pregătiți să extragă informații?', 'so': 'Ma caawinaysaa geedaha canshuurta ee loo tababaray in la soo saaro macluumaad?', 'sv': 'Hjälper Syntax Trees Pre-utbildade Transformers att extrahera information?', 'ta': 'ஒத்திசைவு மரங்கள் பயிற்சி மாற்றுபவர்களுக்கு முன்னால் உதவுகிறதா தகவலை வெளியேற்று?', 'ur': 'کیا سینٹکس ٹریز پیش ترسیم کی تغییرات کی مدد کرتی ہے؟', 'si': 'වාක්ෂික ක්\u200dරීස් උදව් කරන්න ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරවර්තනය කරන්න පුළුවන් තොරතුරු නිර්මාණය කරන්න?', 'sr': 'Da li sintaks drveæa pomaže predobuèenim transformatorima izvlaèiti informaciju?', 'vi': 'Hỗ trợ mặc dịch biến hình đã được đào tạo?', 'uz': '@ info', 'hr': 'Da li sintaksične drveće pomažu predobučenim transformatorima izvlačiti informacije?', 'da': 'Hjælper syntakstræer forududdannede transformatorer med at udtrække oplysninger?', 'nl': 'Helpen Syntax Trees Voorgetrainde Transformers om informatie te extraheren?', 'de': 'Helfen Syntaxbäume vortrainierten Transformatoren, Informationen zu extrahieren?', 'id': 'Apakah Pohon Sintaks membantu Transformer Terlatih Menekstrak Informasi?', 'bg': 'Дали синтаксисните дървета помагат на предварително обучените трансформатори да извличат информация?', 'ko': '문법 트리는 미리 훈련된 변압기에서 정보를 추출하는 데 도움이 됩니까?', 'fa': 'آیا درختهای سینتکس کمک به تغییردهندگان پیش آموزش داده شده اطلاعات خروج می\u200cکنند؟', 'sw': 'Je, mti wa Syntax unasaidia Wasafirishaji wa Taifa zilizo na mafunzo?', 'tr': 'Sintaks agaçlary öňki eğlenen terjime edenlerden Aç Maglumaty?', 'sq': 'A ndihmojnë pemët e sintaksave transformuesit e trajnuar para të nxjerrin informacionin?', 'af': 'Doen Sintaks Boom Hulp Voorsoekte Transformeerders Uitpak Informasie?', 'am': 'የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Sintaks ağacları Ön təhsil edilmiş Transformatçılar Məlumatları Çıqar mı?', 'bn': 'সিন্ক্যাক্স গাছগুলো প্রশিক্ষিত ট্রান্সফার্সারের পূর্বে সাহায্য করা হবে কি তথ্য বিদায়ি', 'hy': 'Արդյո՞ք սինտաքսի ծառերը օգնում են նախապատրաստված վերափոխողներին հանել տեղեկատվությունը:', 'cs': 'Pomáhají syntaxní stromy předškoleným transformátorům extrahovat informace?', 'bs': 'Da li sintaks drveća pomaže predobučenim transformatorima izvlačiti informacije?', 'et': 'Kas süntaksipuud aitavad eelkoolitud transformaatoritel teavet välja võtta?', 'ca': 'Els arbres de sintaxi ajuden els transformadors pré-entrenats a extrair informació?', 'fi': 'Auttavatko Syntaksipuut Pre-koulutettuja Transformers Extract Information?', 'jv': 'Opo siji Kelungan tresnane Tulungan Layar', 'sk': 'Ali sintaksna drevesa pomagajo vnaprej usposobljenim transformatorjem pri pridobivanju informacij?', 'ha': 'Do Syntax Trees Help Pre-trained Transformers Extract Information?', 'he': 'האם עצי סינטקס עוזרים למעברים מאומנים מראש להוציא מידע?', 'bo': 'དབྱེ་སྟངས་སྡོང་བྱེད་རོགས་ཀྱི་རོགས་འདེགས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་ཆས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ'}
{'en': 'Much recent work suggests that incorporating syntax information from dependency trees can improve task-specific transformer models. However, the effect of incorporating dependency tree information into pre-trained transformer models (e.g., BERT) remains unclear, especially given recent studies highlighting how these models implicitly encode syntax. In this work, we systematically study the utility of incorporating dependency trees into pre-trained transformers on three representative information extraction tasks : semantic role labeling (SRL), named entity recognition, and relation extraction. We propose and investigate two distinct strategies for incorporating dependency structure : a late fusion approach, which applies a graph neural network on the output of a transformer, and a joint fusion approach, which infuses syntax structure into the transformer attention layers. These strategies are representative of prior work, but we introduce additional model design elements that are necessary for obtaining improved performance. Our empirical analysis demonstrates that these syntax-infused transformers obtain state-of-the-art results on SRL and relation extraction tasks. However, our analysis also reveals a critical shortcoming of these models : we find that their performance gains are highly contingent on the availability of human-annotated dependency parses, which raises important questions regarding the viability of syntax-augmented transformers in real-world applications.', 'pt': 'Muitos trabalhos recentes sugerem que a incorporação de informações de sintaxe de árvores de dependência pode melhorar os modelos de transformador específicos de tarefas. No entanto, o efeito de incorporar informações de árvore de dependência em modelos de transformador pré-treinados (por exemplo, BERT) permanece incerto, especialmente devido a estudos recentes que destacam como esses modelos codificam implicitamente a sintaxe. Neste trabalho, estudamos sistematicamente a utilidade de incorporar árvores de dependência em transformadores pré-treinados em três tarefas representativas de extração de informações: rotulagem de papéis semânticos (SRL), reconhecimento de entidades nomeadas e extração de relações. Propomos e investigamos duas estratégias distintas para incorporar a estrutura de dependência: uma abordagem de fusão tardia, que aplica uma rede neural de grafos na saída de um transformador, e uma abordagem de fusão conjunta, que infunde estrutura de sintaxe nas camadas de atenção do transformador. Essas estratégias são representativas de trabalhos anteriores, mas introduzimos elementos adicionais de design de modelo que são necessários para obter um desempenho aprimorado. Nossa análise empírica demonstra que esses transformadores com infusão de sintaxe obtêm resultados de última geração em tarefas de SRL e extração de relações. No entanto, nossa análise também revela uma falha crítica desses modelos: descobrimos que seus ganhos de desempenho são altamente dependentes da disponibilidade de análises de dependência anotadas por humanos, o que levanta questões importantes sobre a viabilidade de transformadores de sintaxe aumentada em aplicativos do mundo real.', 'es': 'Muchos trabajos recientes sugieren que la incorporación de información de sintaxis de los árboles de dependencias puede mejorar los modelos de transformadores específicos de la tarea. Sin embargo, el efecto de incorporar la información del árbol de dependencias en modelos de transformadores previamente entrenados (por ejemplo, BERT) sigue sin estar claro, especialmente teniendo en cuenta los estudios recientes que destacan cómo estos modelos codifican implícitamente la sintaxis. En este trabajo, estudiamos sistemáticamente la utilidad de incorporar árboles de dependencias en transformadores previamente entrenados en tres tareas de extracción de información representativas: etiquetado semántico de roles (SRL), reconocimiento de entidades nombradas y extracción de relaciones. Proponemos e investigamos dos estrategias distintas para incorporar la estructura de dependencia: un enfoque de fusión tardía, que aplica una red neuronal gráfica en la salida de un transformador, y un enfoque de fusión conjunta, que infunde la estructura sintáctica en las capas de atención del transformador. Estas estrategias son representativas de trabajos anteriores, pero introducimos elementos de diseño de modelos adicionales que son necesarios para obtener un rendimiento mejorado. Nuestro análisis empírico demuestra que estos transformadores con infusión de sintaxis obtienen resultados de vanguardia en las tareas de extracción de SRL y relaciones. Sin embargo, nuestro análisis también revela una deficiencia crítica de estos modelos: descubrimos que sus ganancias de rendimiento dependen en gran medida de la disponibilidad de análisis de dependencias anotados por humanos, lo que plantea cuestiones importantes con respecto a la viabilidad de los transformadores aumentados de sintaxis en aplicaciones del mundo real.', 'ja': '最近の研究では、依存関係ツリーからの構文情報を取り入れることで、タスク固有の変圧器モデルを改善できることが示唆されている。 しかし、特にこれらのモデルが構文を暗黙的に符号化する方法を強調する最近の研究を考えると、事前に訓練された変圧器モデル（例えば、BERT ）に依存性ツリー情報を組み込む効果はまだ不明である。 この研究では、3つの代表的な情報抽出タスクである意味役割ラベリング（ SRL ）、名前付きエンティティ認識、および関係抽出について、依存関係ツリーを事前にトレーニングされた変圧器に組み込むことの有用性を体系的に検討します。 依存構造を組み込むための2つの異なる戦略を提案し、検討します。つまり、変圧器の出力にグラフニューラルネットワークを適用する後期融合アプローチと、構文構造を変圧器の注意層に注入する関節融合アプローチです。 これらの戦略は以前の作業を代表するものですが、パフォーマンスの向上に必要な追加のモデル設計要素を導入しています。 私たちの経験的分析は、これらの構文挿入変圧器がSRLと関係抽出タスクで最先端の結果を得ることを示しています。 しかし、私たちの分析はまた、これらのモデルの重要な欠点を明らかにします。私たちは、それらのパフォーマンスの向上は、人間が注釈した依存関係解析の可用性に大きく依存していることがわかります。これは、現実のアプリケーションにおける構文拡張変圧器の生存可能性に関する重要な疑問を提起します。', 'ar': 'تشير الكثير من الأعمال الحديثة إلى أن دمج معلومات بناء الجملة من أشجار التبعية يمكن أن يحسن نماذج المحولات الخاصة بالمهمة. ومع ذلك ، فإن تأثير دمج معلومات شجرة التبعية في نماذج المحولات المدربة مسبقًا (على سبيل المثال ، BERT) لا يزال غير واضح ، لا سيما بالنظر إلى الدراسات الحديثة التي تسلط الضوء على كيفية تشفير هذه النماذج ضمنيًا لبناء الجملة. في هذا العمل ، ندرس بشكل منهجي فائدة دمج أشجار التبعية في محولات مدربة مسبقًا في ثلاث مهام تمثيلية لاستخراج المعلومات: وسم الدور الدلالي (SRL) ، والتعرف على الكيانات المسماة ، واستخراج العلاقة. نحن نقترح ونحقق في استراتيجيتين متميزتين لدمج بنية التبعية: نهج الاندماج المتأخر ، والذي يطبق شبكة عصبية بيانية على ناتج محول ، ونهج اندماج مشترك ، والذي ينقل بنية بناء الجملة إلى طبقات انتباه المحولات. تمثل هذه الاستراتيجيات العمل السابق ، لكننا نقدم عناصر تصميم نموذج إضافية ضرورية للحصول على أداء محسن. يوضح تحليلنا التجريبي أن هذه المحولات المشبعة في بناء الجملة تحصل على أحدث النتائج في SRL ومهام استخراج العلاقات. ومع ذلك ، يكشف تحليلنا أيضًا عن عيب خطير في هذه النماذج: نجد أن مكاسبها في الأداء تعتمد بشكل كبير على توفر تحليل التبعية المشروح ، الأمر الذي يثير أسئلة مهمة بشأن جدوى المحولات المعززة في بناء الجملة في تطبيقات العالم الحقيقي.', 'fr': "De nombreux travaux récents suggèrent que l'intégration d'informations de syntaxe provenant d'arbres de dépendance peut améliorer les modèles de transformateurs spécifiques aux tâches. Cependant, l'effet de l'intégration des informations de l'arbre de dépendance dans des modèles de transformateurs pré-entraînés (par exemple, BERT) reste flou, en particulier compte tenu des études récentes soulignant comment ces modèles encodent implicitement la syntaxe. Dans ce travail, nous étudions systématiquement l'utilité d'intégrer des arbres de dépendance dans des transformateurs pré-entraînés sur trois tâches d'extraction d'informations représentatives\xa0: l'étiquetage de rôle sémantique (SRL), la reconnaissance d'entités nommées et l'extraction de relations. Nous proposons et étudions deux stratégies distinctes pour intégrer la structure de dépendance\xa0: une approche de fusion tardive, qui applique un réseau de neurones de graphe sur la sortie d'un transformateur, et une approche de fusion conjointe, qui infuse une structure syntaxique dans les couches d'attention du transformateur. Ces stratégies sont représentatives des travaux antérieurs, mais nous introduisons des éléments de conception de modèle supplémentaires qui sont nécessaires pour obtenir des performances améliorées. Notre analyse empirique démontre que ces transformateurs infusés de syntaxe obtiennent des résultats de pointe sur les tâches d'extraction de relation et de SRL. Cependant, notre analyse révèle également une lacune critique de ces modèles\xa0: nous constatons que leurs gains de performance dépendent fortement de la disponibilité d'analyses de dépendance annotées par l'homme, ce qui soulève d'importantes questions concernant la viabilité des transformateurs augmentés par la syntaxe dans les applications réelles.", 'zh': '近者多讲明,并自恃树语法信可改特定于任转换器。 然并之于先练转换器(如BERT)之不明,特思近者之究隐式编码语法。 于此之事,系统地究并倚于预练之转换器,及三代表性之信:语义角色标(SRL),命曰实体。 后期融合之法,其神经网络应用于变压器者输之,及合之者,注语法于转换器层中。 此策代前事,引入他模样, 臣等实分析表明,此注语法之变压器,于SRL取任最先进也。 然亦发其要病:见其性升于人工注解析之可用性,发于语法转换器用于实用之要。', 'hi': 'बहुत हाल के काम से पता चलता है कि निर्भरता पेड़ों से वाक्यविन्यास जानकारी को शामिल करने से कार्य-विशिष्ट ट्रांसफार्मर मॉडल में सुधार हो सकता है। हालांकि, पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित ट्रांसफॉर्मर मॉडल (जैसे, BERT) में निर्भरता पेड़ की जानकारी को शामिल करने का प्रभाव अस्पष्ट बना हुआ है, विशेष रूप से हाल के अध्ययनों को इस बात पर प्रकाश डाला गया है कि ये मॉडल वाक्यविन्यास को कैसे स्पष्ट रूप से एन्कोड करते हैं। इस काम में, हम तीन प्रतिनिधि सूचना निष्कर्षण कार्यों पर पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित ट्रांसफार्मर में निर्भरता पेड़ों को शामिल करने की उपयोगिता का व्यवस्थित रूप से अध्ययन करते हैं: शब्दार्थ भूमिका लेबलिंग (एसआरएल), नामित इकाई मान्यता, और संबंध निष्कर्षण। हम निर्भरता संरचना को शामिल करने के लिए दो अलग-अलग रणनीतियों का प्रस्ताव और जांच करते हैं: एक देर से संलयन दृष्टिकोण, जो एक ट्रांसफार्मर के आउटपुट पर एक ग्राफ तंत्रिका नेटवर्क लागू करता है, और एक संयुक्त संलयन दृष्टिकोण, जो ट्रांसफॉर्मर ध्यान परतों में वाक्यविन्यास संरचना को शामिल करता है। ये रणनीतियां पूर्व कार्य के प्रतिनिधि हैं, लेकिन हम अतिरिक्त मॉडल डिजाइन तत्वों को पेश करते हैं जो बेहतर प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करने के लिए आवश्यक हैं। हमारे अनुभवजन्य विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि ये वाक्यविन्यास-संक्रमित ट्रांसफॉर्मर एसआरएल और संबंध निष्कर्षण कार्यों पर अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त करते हैं। हालांकि, हमारे विश्लेषण से इन मॉडलों की एक महत्वपूर्ण कमी का भी पता चलता है: हम पाते हैं कि उनके प्रदर्शन लाभ मानव-एनोटेट निर्भरता पार्स की उपलब्धता पर अत्यधिक आकस्मिक हैं, जो वास्तविक दुनिया के अनुप्रयोगों में वाक्यविन्यास-संवर्धित ट्रांसफार्मर की व्यवहार्यता के बारे में महत्वपूर्ण सवाल उठाता है।', 'ga': 'Tugann a lán oibre le déanaí le tuiscint gur féidir feabhas a chur ar mhúnlaí claochladáin a bhaineann go sonrach le tasc-shonrach trí fhaisnéis chomhréire ó chrainn spleáchais a ionchorprú. Mar sin féin, tá an éifeacht a bhaineann le faisnéis crann spleáchais a ionchorprú i múnlaí claochladán réamhoilte (m.sh., BERT) doiléir fós, go háirithe i bhfianaise staidéir le déanaí a leagann béim ar an gcaoi a ndéanann na samhlacha sin comhréir a ionchódú go hintuigthe. San obair seo, déanaimid staidéar córasach ar áirgiúlacht crainn spleáchais a ionchorprú i gclaochladáin réamhoilte ar thrí thasc ionadaíocha astarraingthe faisnéise: lipéadú róil shéimeantach (SRL), aithint aonáin ainmnithe, agus eastóscadh gaol. Molaimid agus imscrúdóimid dhá straitéis ar leith chun struchtúr spleáchais a ionchorprú: cur chuige comhleá déanach, a chuireann líonra néarach graf i bhfeidhm ar aschur claochladán, agus cur chuige comhleá, a insíonn struchtúr comhréire isteach i sraitheanna aird an chlaochladáin. Tá na straitéisí seo ionadaíoch ar réamhobair, ach tugaimid isteach eilimintí dearaidh samhlacha breise atá riachtanach chun feidhmíocht fheabhsaithe a bhaint amach. Léiríonn ár n-anailís eimpíreach go bhfaigheann na claochladáin insíothlaithe seo torthaí den scoth ar thascanna SRL agus astarraingthe gaol. Mar sin féin, léiríonn ár n-anailís easnamh criticiúil na múnlaí seo: feicimid go bhfuil a ngnóthachan feidhmíochta ag brath go mór ar infhaighteacht parsanna spleáchais anótáilte ag an duine, rud a ardaíonn ceisteanna tábhachtacha maidir le hinmharthanacht trasfhoirmeoirí méadaithe comhréire i bhfeidhmchláir fhíorshaoil.', 'ru': 'Много недавних работ показывают, что включение синтаксической информации из деревьев зависимостей может улучшить модели трансформаторов для конкретных задач. Тем не менее, эффект включения информации о дереве зависимостей в предварительно обученные модели трансформаторов (например, BERT) остается неясным, особенно учитывая недавние исследования, подчеркивающие, как эти модели неявно кодируют синтаксис. В этой работе мы систематически изучаем полезность включения деревьев зависимостей в предварительно обученные трансформаторы по трем представительным задачам извлечения информации: обозначение семантической роли (SRL), распознавание именованных сущностей и извлечение отношений. Мы предлагаем и исследуем две различные стратегии для включения структуры зависимостей: поздний подход слияния, который применяет графовую нейронную сеть на выходе трансформатора, и совместный подход слияния, который внедряет синтаксическую структуру в слои внимания трансформатора. Эти стратегии являются репрезентативными для предыдущей работы, но мы вводим дополнительные элементы дизайна модели, которые необходимы для получения улучшенной производительности. Наш эмпирический анализ показывает, что эти синтаксические трансформаторы получают самые современные результаты по задачам извлечения SRL и отношений. Однако наш анализ также выявляет критический недостаток этих моделей: мы обнаруживаем, что их повышение производительности в значительной степени зависит от наличия аннотированных человеком анализов зависимостей, что поднимает важные вопросы относительно жизнеспособности синтаксически дополненных трансформаторов в реальных приложениях.', 'hu': 'Sok 첬jabb munka azt sugallja, hogy a f체gg흷s챕gi f찼kb처l sz찼rmaz처 szintaxisinform찼ci처k be챕p챠t챕se jav챠thatja a feladatspecifikus transzform찼tormodelleket. Ugyanakkor a f체gg흷s챕gi fa inform찼ci처inak be챕p챠t챕s챕nek hat찼sa el흷re k챕pzett transzform찼tormodellekbe (pl. BERT) tov찼bbra sem vil찼gos, k체l철n철sen a legut처bbi tanulm찼nyok alapj찼n, amelyek r찼vil찼g챠tanak arra, hogy ezek a modellek mik챕nt k처dolj찼k implicit m처don a szintaxist. Ebben a munk찼ban h찼rom reprezentat챠v inform찼ci처kinyer챕si feladat keret챕ben szisztematikusan tanulm찼nyozzuk a f체gg흷s챕gi f찼k el흷k챕pzett transzform찼torokba t철rt챕n흷 be챕p챠t챕s챕nek hasznoss찼g찼t: szemantikus szerepkoc챠mk챕z챕s (SRL), elnevezett entit찼s felismer챕s 챕s kapcsolatkinyer챕s. K챕t k체l철nb철z흷 strat챕gi찼t javasolunk 챕s vizsg찼lunk a f체gg흷s챕gi strukt첬ra be챕p챠t챕s챕re: egy k챕s흷i f첬zi처s megk철zel챠t챕st, amely egy transzform찼tor kimenet챕re gr찼f neur찼lis h찼l처zatot alkalmaz, 챕s egy k철z철s f첬zi처s megk철zel챠t챕st, amely szintaxisszerkezetet ad 찼t a transzform찼tor figyelmi r챕tegeibe. Ezek a strat챕gi찼k reprezentat챠vak a kor찼bbi munk찼ra, de tov찼bbi modelltervez챕si elemeket vezet체nk be, amelyek a jobb teljes챠tm챕ny el챕r챕s챕hez sz체ks챕gesek. empirikus elemz챕s체nk azt mutatja, hogy ezek a szintaxisos transzform찼torok korszer킥 eredm챕nyeket kapnak az SRL 챕s a kapcsolatkitermel챕si feladatok tekintet챕ben. Elemz챕s체nk azonban ezeknek a modelleknek a kritikus hi찼nyoss찼gait is felt찼rja: meg찼llap챠tjuk, hogy teljes챠tm챕nyn철veked챕s체k nagym챕rt챕kben f체gg az emberi jegyzetekkel ell찼tott f체gg흷s챕gi elemz챕sek rendelkez챕sre 찼ll찼s찼t처l, ami fontos k챕rd챕seket vet fel a szintaxiskiterjeszt챕s킥 transzform찼torok 챕letk챕pess챕g챕vel kapcsolatban val처s alkalmaz찼sokban.', 'el': 'Πολλές πρόσφατες εργασίες δείχνουν ότι η ενσωμάτωση πληροφοριών σύνταξης από δέντρα εξάρτησης μπορεί να βελτιώσει τα μοντέλα μετασχηματιστών ειδικά για την εργασία. Ωστόσο, η επίδραση της ενσωμάτωσης πληροφοριών δέντρου εξάρτησης σε προ-εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα μετασχηματιστών (π.χ., BERT) παραμένει ασαφής, ειδικά δεδομένου πρόσφατων μελετών που επισημαίνουν πώς αυτά τα μοντέλα κωδικοποιούν σιωπηρά τη σύνταξη. Σε αυτή την εργασία, μελετούμε συστηματικά τη χρησιμότητα της ενσωμάτωσης δέντρων εξάρτησης σε προ-εκπαιδευμένους μετασχηματιστές σε τρεις αντιπροσωπευτικές εργασίες εξαγωγής πληροφοριών: σημασιολογική σήμανση ρόλων (αναγνώριση ονομαστικών οντοτήτων και εξαγωγή σχέσεων. Προτείνουμε και διερευνούμε δύο διαφορετικές στρατηγικές ενσωμάτωσης της δομής εξάρτησης: μια προσέγγιση όψης σύντηξης, η οποία εφαρμόζει ένα γράφημα νευρωνικό δίκτυο στην έξοδο ενός μετασχηματιστή, και μια κοινή προσέγγιση σύντηξης, η οποία εισάγει τη δομή σύνταξης στα στρώματα προσοχής του μετασχηματιστή. Αυτές οι στρατηγικές είναι αντιπροσωπευτικές των προηγούμενων εργασιών, αλλά εισάγουμε πρόσθετα στοιχεία σχεδιασμού μοντέλων που είναι απαραίτητα για την επίτευξη βελτιωμένης απόδοσης. Η εμπειρική ανάλυση μας αποδεικνύει ότι αυτοί οι μετασχηματιστές εμποτισμένοι με σύνταξη λαμβάνουν τα τελευταία αποτελέσματα σε εργασίες εξαγωγής και εξαγωγής σχέσεων. Ωστόσο, η ανάλυσή μας αποκαλύπτει επίσης ένα κρίσιμο μειονέκτημα αυτών των μοντέλων: διαπιστώνουμε ότι τα κέρδη απόδοσης τους εξαρτώνται σε μεγάλο βαθμό από τη διαθεσιμότητα αναλύσεων εξάρτησης με σχόλια από τον άνθρωπο, γεγονός που εγείρει σημαντικά ερωτήματα σχετικά με τη βιωσιμότητα των μετασχηματιστών ενισχυμένων σύνταξης σε πραγματικές εφαρμογές.', 'ka': 'ბევრი ახალი სამუშაო სამუშაო მუშაობა იტყვებს, რომ სინტაქსის ინფორმაციის შეყვარება დამხოლოდ სამუშაო ხელებიდან შეუძლება გაუქმ მაგრამ განსაკუთრებულობის ინფორმაციის შეყვარება სახელის მოდელში (მაგალითად, BERT) უცნობიერი იქნება, განსაკუთრებით განსაკუთრებული ახალი სწავლებების განსაკუთრება როგორ ეს მოდელები ინფლიციურად სინ ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ სისტემატიკურად შევსწავლობთ სამუშაო ინფორმაციის ექსტრაქციის სამუშაო სამუშაო ინფორმაციის ექსტრაქციის სამუშაო სამუშაო პროლის ნიშვნა (SRL), სახელი ინტერტი ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ და განსხვავებთ ორი განსხვავებული სტრატიგური სტრუქტურის შეყვარებისთვის: დასრულებული ფუქტურის მიღება, რომელიც განსხვავებული ნეიროლური ქსელის გამოყენებაში და ერთადერთი ფუქტურის მიღება, რომელიც სი ეს სტრატეგიები წინა სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო რესპენტირებიან, მაგრამ ჩვენ ჩვენ დავაყენებთ დამატებული მოდელური დიზაინის ელემენტები, რო ჩვენი ემპერიკალური ანალიზი გამოჩვენებს, რომ ეს სინტაქქსის ინფორმაციული ტრანფორმაციები მიიღებენ სინტაქქსის შედეგები SRL და შესახებ ექსტრაქციის საქმედებზე. მაგრამ ჩვენი ანალიზია ამ მოდელების კრიტიკური დაბრუნება: ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ მათი პროცესტის შესაძლებლობა ძალიან კონტენგენტიურია ადამიანის ანოტირებულობის პროცესების შესაძლებლობაზე, რომელიც სინტაქსის აზრუმენტი', 'it': "Molti lavori recenti suggeriscono che incorporare informazioni sintattiche da alberi di dipendenza può migliorare i modelli di trasformatori specifici per attività. Tuttavia, l'effetto dell'incorporazione delle informazioni sull'albero delle dipendenze in modelli di trasformatori pre-addestrati (ad esempio BERT) rimane poco chiaro, soprattutto in considerazione di recenti studi che evidenziano come questi modelli codificano implicitamente la sintassi. In questo lavoro, studiamo sistematicamente l'utilità di incorporare alberi di dipendenza in trasformatori pre-addestrati su tre compiti rappresentativi di estrazione delle informazioni: semantic role labeling (SRL), named entity recognition, ed estrazione delle relazioni. Proponiamo e analizziamo due strategie distinte per incorporare la struttura di dipendenza: un approccio di fusione tardiva, che applica una rete neurale grafica sull'uscita di un trasformatore, e un approccio di fusione congiunta, che infonde la struttura sintattica negli strati di attenzione del trasformatore. Queste strategie sono rappresentative del lavoro precedente, ma introduciamo ulteriori elementi di progettazione del modello necessari per ottenere prestazioni migliori. La nostra analisi empirica dimostra che questi trasformatori infusi di sintassi ottengono risultati all'avanguardia su SRL e attività di estrazione delle relazioni. Tuttavia, la nostra analisi rivela anche una lacuna critica di questi modelli: scopriamo che i loro guadagni di performance sono fortemente condizionati dalla disponibilità di analisi di dipendenza annotate dall'uomo, il che solleva importanti interrogativi sulla fattibilità dei trasformatori sintassi-aumentati nelle applicazioni del mondo reale.", 'lt': 'Daug neseniai atliktų darbų rodo, kad integruojant sintaksinę informaciją iš priklausomybės medžių galima pagerinti konkrečioms užduotims būdingus transformatorių modelius. Tačiau informacijos apie priklausomybę medžius įtraukimo į iš anksto parengtus transformatorių modelius (pvz., BERT) poveikis vis dar neaiškus, ypač atsižvelgiant į neseniai atliktus tyrimus, kuriuose pabrėžiama, kaip šie modeliai netiesiogiai koduoja sintaksą. Šiame darbe sistemingai tiriame priklausomybės medžių įtraukimo į iš anksto apmokytus transformatorius naudą atliekant tris reprezentatyvias informacijos gavimo užduotis: semantinio vaidmens ženklinimą (SRL), pavadinimą subjekto pripažinimą ir santykių gavimą. Siūlome ir tiriame dvi atskiras priklausomybės struktūros integravimo strategijas: vėluojančios branduolinės sintezės metodą, kuris naudoja grafinį nervinį tinklą transformatoriaus išėjimo atžvilgiu, ir jungtinį branduolinės sintezės metodą, kuris sintakso struktūrą įleidžia į transformatoriaus dėmesio sluoksnius. Šios strategijos yra reprezentatyvios ankstesniam darbui, tačiau mes įvedame papildomus modelio projektavimo elementus, būtinus pagerinti veiklos rezultatus. Mūsų empirinė analizė rodo, kad šie sintaksu infuzuoti transformatoriai gauna naujausius rezultatus dėl SRL ir santykių gavimo užduočių. However, our analysis also reveals a critical shortcoming of these models: we find that their performance gains are highly contingent on the availability of human-annotated dependency parses, which raises important questions regarding the viability of syntax-augmented transformers in real-world applications.', 'kk': 'Жуырдағы жұмыс көптеген синтаксис мәліметін тәуелдік ағаштарынан ендіру үшін тапсырманың ерекше түрлендіруші үлгілерін жақсартуға болады. Бірақ тәуелсіздік ағаш мәліметін алдын- оқылған түрлендіру үлгілеріне (мысалы, BERT) ендіру эффекті білмейді, өзіне жаңа зерттеулердің бұл үлгілердің синтаксисын қалай кодтамасын бояулау Бұл жұмыс ішінде, біз жүйелік түрлік ағаштарды үш келтірілген мәліметті тарқату тапсырмаларына алдын- оқылған түрлендірушерге қосу утилитасын зерттейміз: semantic role labelling (SRL), аталған нысандарды анықтау және қаты Тәуелсіздік құрылғысын ендіру үшін екі түрлі стратегияларды ұсынып, зерттеуді ұсынып тастаймыз: аяқтау тәсілі, бұл трансформацияның шығысында график невралдық желі және біріктіру тәсілі, синтаксис құрылғысын түрл Бұл стратегиялар алдыңғы жұмыстың негізгі, бірақ біз жақсы жұмыс істеу үшін қажетті қосымша үлгі дизайн элементтерін келтіреміз. Біздің эмпирикалық анализ бұл синтаксис инфликт қолданылған түрлендірушілер SRL және қатынастық тарқату тапсырмаларының күй- жай нәтижесін алады дегенді көрсетеді. Біздің анализиямыз осы үлгілердің қауіпсіздігін көрсетеді: біз олардың оқиғалары адамдардың белгілікті тәуелдік талдау талдауларының мүмкіндігіне көмектеседі, бұл синтаксис өзгертілген түрлендірушілердің тәуелдігін шын', 'ms': 'Kerja yang baru-baru ini menunjukkan bahawa memasukkan maklumat sintaks dari pokok dependensi boleh meningkatkan model pengubah khusus tugas. Namun, kesan memasukkan maklumat pepohon dependensi ke dalam model pengubah yang dilatih-dilatih (contohnya BERT) tetap tidak jelas, terutama diberikan kajian baru-baru ini menyatakan bagaimana model ini secara implicit mengekodkan sintaks. Dalam kerja ini, kami secara sistematik mempelajari utiliti untuk memasukkan pokok dependensi ke dalam pengubah yang dilatih-dilatih pada tiga tugas ekstraksi maklumat mewakili: label peranan semantik (SRL), pengenalan entiti bernama, dan ekstraksi hubungan. Kami melamar dan menyelidiki dua strategi yang berbeza untuk memasukkan struktur dependensi: pendekatan fusi lewat, yang melaksanakan rangkaian saraf graf pada output pengubah, dan pendekatan fusi bersama, yang menginspirasi struktur sintaks ke dalam lapisan perhatian pengubah. Strategi ini adalah mewakili kerja sebelumnya, tetapi kami memperkenalkan unsur desain model tambahan yang diperlukan untuk mendapatkan prestasi yang lebih baik. Analisis empirik kami menunjukkan bahawa pengubah sintaks ini mendapat keputusan terbaik pada SRL dan tugas ekstraksi hubungan. Bagaimanapun, analisis kami juga mengungkapkan kekurangan kritik bagi model ini: kami mendapati keuntungan prestasi mereka sangat tergantung pada kebebasan analisis dependensi yang dicatat oleh manusia, yang mengakibatkan soalan penting mengenai kebolehan pengubah yang meningkat sintaks dalam aplikasi dunia nyata.', 'mk': 'Многу неодамнешна работа покажува дека вклучувањето на информации за синтаксија од дрвјата за зависност може да ги подобри моделите на трансформатор специфични за задачите. Сепак, ефектот на вклучувањето на информациите за дрвото на зависност во предобучените трансформаторски модели (на пример, БЕРТ) останува нејасен, особено со оглед на неодамнешните студии кои истакнуваат како овие модели имплицитно кодираат синтаксис. Во оваа работа, систематично ја проучуваме корисноста на вклучувањето на дрвјата на зависност во предобучени трансформатори за три репрезентативни задачи за извлекување информации: семантичко означување на улогата (СРЛ), именувано препознавање на ентитетите, и извлекување на Предложуваме и истражуваме две различни стратегии за вклучување на структурата на зависност: доцна фузија пристап, кој применува графска неврална мрежа на излезот на трансформатор, и заеднички фузија пристап, кој инфузира синтаксична структура во слоевите на внимание на трансформаторот. Овие стратегии се претставници на претходната работа, но ние воведуваме дополнителни елементи на модел дизајн кои се неопходни за постигнување подобрени резултати. Нашата емпирична анализа покажува дека овие инфузирани трансформатори добиваат најсовремени резултати на SRL и врските со извлекувањето задачи. Сепак, нашата анализа, исто така, открива критичен недостаток на овие модели: откриваме дека нивните постигнувања на перформансата се високо зависни од достапноста на анализи за зависност кои се анализирани од човекот, што предизвикува важни прашања во врска со животноста на трансформаторите зголемени со синтаксија во реалните ап', 'ml': 'അടുത്ത പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d വളരെ പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു, ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന മരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും സിന്\u200dകാസ് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ച എന്നാലും മുമ്പ് പരിശീലന മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ മോഡലിലേക്ക് ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം വ്യക്തമായിരിക്കുന്നു.  ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d സിസ്ട്രീമികമായി ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു, ആശ്രമത്തിന്റെ വൃക്ഷങ്ങള്\u200d മുമ്പ് പരിശീലനീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട മാറ്റങ്ങളിലേക്ക് ചേര്\u200dക്കുന് ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള രണ്ടു വ്യത്യസ്തമായ യുദ്ധങ്ങള്\u200d നാം പരിശോധിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. വൈകാതെ ഫ്യൂഷന്\u200d സംവിധാനത്തിലേക്ക് ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. അത് മാറ്റുന്നതിന്റെ ഫലം  ഈ പദ്ധതികള്\u200d മുമ്പ് ജോലിയുടെ പ്രതിനിധികളാണ്, പക്ഷെ മെച്ചപ്പെട്ട പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കാന്\u200d ആവശ്യമുള്ള മോഡല്\u200d ഡിസൈ Our empirical analysis demonstrates that these syntax-infused transformers obtain state-of-the-art results on SRL and relation extraction tasks.  എന്നാലും നമ്മുടെ അന്വേഷണം ഈ മാതൃകങ്ങളുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നുവെന്ന് വെളിപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു; അവരുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d മനുഷ്യരുടെ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന ആശ്', 'mt': 'Ħafna xogħol reċenti jissuġġerixxi li l-inkorporazzjoni ta’ informazzjoni ta’ sintaks minn siġar ta’ dipendenza tista’ ttejjeb mudelli ta’ trasformazzjoni speċifiċi għall-kompiti. Madankollu, l-effett tal-inkorporazzjoni tal-informazzjoni dwar is-siġar tad-dipendenza f’mudelli ta’ trasformaturi mħarrġa minn qabel (pereżempju BERT) g ħadu mhux ċar, speċjalment minħabba studji riċenti li jenfasizzaw kif dawn il-mudelli impliċitament jikkodifikaw is-sintaks. In this work, we systematically study the utility of incorporating dependency trees into pre-trained transformers on three representative information extraction tasks: semantic role labeling (SRL), named entity recognition, and relation extraction.  We propose and investigate two distinct strategies for incorporating dependency structure: a late fusion approach, which applies a graph neural network on the output of a transformer, and a joint fusion approach, which infuses syntax structure into the transformer attention layers.  Dawn l-istrateġiji huma rappreżentattivi tax-xogħol preċedenti, iżda nintroduċu elementi addizzjonali tad-disinn tal-mudell li huma meħtieġa biex tinkiseb prestazzjoni mtejba. L-analiżi empirika tagħna turi li dawn it-trasformaturi infużi bis-sintaks jiksbu riżultati l-aktar avvanzati dwar l-SRL u l-kompiti ta’ estrazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet. Madankollu, l-analiżi tagħna turi wkoll nuqqasijiet kritiċi ta’ dawn il-mudelli: isibu li l-kisbiet fil-prestazzjoni tagħhom huma kontinġenti ħafna fuq id-disponibbiltà ta’ analiżijiet tad-dipendenza annotati mill-bniedem, li jqajmu mistoqsijiet importanti rigward il-vijabbiltà ta’ trasformaturi miżjuda bis-sintaks f’applikazzjonijiet tad-dinja reali.', 'mn': 'Саяхан ажлын ихэнх нь хамааралтай модоос синтаксис мэдээллийг нэгтгэх нь ажлын тодорхой шилжүүлэгч загваруудыг сайжруулж чадна. Гэхдээ хамааралтай модны мэдээллийг урд сургалтын шилжүүлэгчийн загвар болгох нөлөө (жишээ нь BERT) нь тодорхой байдаг. Ялангуяа саяхан судалгаагаар эдгээр загваруудын синтаксисыг хэрхэн шилжүүлж байгааг тодорхойлдог. Энэ ажлын тухай бид систематикийн судалгаанд хамааралтай модыг урьд сургалтын шилжүүлэгчид гурван төлөөлөгч мэдээллийн гаргах үйл ажиллагааны тусламжтайгаар нэгтгэх хэрэгтэй зүйлийг судалж байна: semantic role labeling (SRL), entity recognition, relation extraction. Бид хамааралтай бүтцийг нэгтгэх хоёр ялгаатай стратегийг суралцаж, судалгаа хийдэг. Өнгөрсөн хамтдаа хамтдаа хамтдаа шилжүүлэгчдийн үр дүнд график мэдрэлийн сүлжээг ашиглаж, хамтдаа хамтдаа хамтдаа хамтдаа хамтдаа арга Эдгээр стратеги нь өмнөх ажлын төлөөлөгч, гэхдээ бид улам сайжруулах үед хэрэгтэй нэмэлт загварын загварын элементүүдийг танилцуулдаг. Бидний эмперикийн шинжилгээ нь эдгээр синтаксис хэрэглэгдсэн шинжилгээчүүд SRL болон хамааралтын ажлын төвшин урлагийн үр дүнг авдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Гэхдээ бидний шинжилгээ мөн эдгээр загваруудын чухал алдагдлыг илэрхийлж байна: бид тэдний үйлдвэрлэлийн ялгаа нь хүн төрөлхтний хамааралтай хамааралтай ажиллагааны талаар маш чухал асуулт гаргадаг. Энэ нь бодит ертөнцийн хэрэглээнд синтаксис нэмэгдсэн шинжилгээчийн ам', 'ro': 'Multe lucrări recente sugerează că încorporarea informațiilor sintaxiale din arborii de dependență poate îmbunătăți modelele de transformatoare specifice sarcinilor. Cu toate acestea, efectul încorporării informațiilor despre arborele de dependență în modele pre-instruite de transformatori (de exemplu, BERT) rămâne neclar, mai ales având în vedere studiile recente care evidențiază modul în care aceste modele codează implicit sintaxa. În această lucrare, studiem sistematic utilitatea încorporării arborilor de dependență în transformatoare pre-instruite pe trei sarcini reprezentative de extragere a informației: etichetarea rolului semantic (SRL), recunoașterea entității denumite și extragerea relațiilor. Propunem și investigăm două strategii distincte pentru încorporarea structurii dependenței: o abordare de fuziune târzie, care aplică o rețea neurală grafică la ieșirea unui transformator, și o abordare comună de fuziune, care infuzează structura sintaxei în straturile de atenție ale transformatorului. Aceste strategii sunt reprezentative pentru activitatea anterioară, dar introducem elemente suplimentare de proiectare a modelului care sunt necesare pentru obținerea performanțelor îmbunătățite. Analiza noastră empirică demonstrează că aceste transformatoare infuzate de sintaxă obțin rezultate de ultimă generație în domeniul SRL și al activităților de extragere a relațiilor. Cu toate acestea, analiza noastră relevă și o deficiență critică a acestor modele: constatăm că câștigurile lor de performanță sunt foarte condiționate de disponibilitatea analizelor de dependență adnotate de om, ceea ce ridică întrebări importante privind viabilitatea transformatoarelor cu sintaxă augmentată în aplicațiile din lumea reală.', 'pl': 'Wiele ostatnich prac sugeruje, że włączenie informacji składni z drzew zależności może ulepszyć modele transformatorów specyficznych dla zadania. Jednak efekt włączenia informacji o drzewie zależności do wstępnie przeszkolonych modeli transformatorów (np. BERT) pozostaje niejasny, zwłaszcza biorąc pod uwagę ostatnie badania podkreślające, w jaki sposób modele te domyślnie kodują składnię. W niniejszej pracy systematycznie badamy użyteczność włączania drzew zależności do wstępnie przeszkolonych transformatorów w trzech reprezentatywnych zadaniach ekstrakcji informacji: semantycznego oznaczania roli (SRL), rozpoznawania nazwanych jednostek i ekstrakcji relacji. Proponujemy i zbadamy dwie odrębne strategie włączania struktury zależności: podejście późnej fuzji, które stosuje wykres sieci neuronowej na wyjściu transformatora oraz podejście wspólne fuzji, które wprowadza strukturę składni do warstw uwagi transformatora. Strategie te są reprezentatywne dla wcześniejszych prac, ale wprowadzamy dodatkowe elementy projektowania modeli niezbędne do uzyskania poprawy wydajności. Nasza empiryczna analiza pokazuje, że transformatory te uzyskują najnowocześniejsze wyniki dotyczące zadań ekstrakcji SRL i relacji. Nasza analiza ujawnia jednak również krytyczne niedociągnięcie tych modeli: stwierdzimy, że ich wzrost wydajności jest w dużym stopniu uzależniony od dostępności analiz zależności z adnotacją człowieka, co rodzi ważne pytania dotyczące rentowności transformatorów rozszerzonych składnią w aplikacjach rzeczywistych.', 'so': "Shaqo badan ee ugu dhowaaday waxay muuqanayaan in laguugu soo geliyo macluumaadka canshuurta ee geedaha ku xiran ee lagu xiriirayo uu beddeli karo qaababka beddelka shaqo gaar ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, saamaynta ku qorashada macluumaadka geedka ku xiran e e u bedela modellada is-beddelka (e.g. BERT) waxay sii jirtaa wax cad, hasa yeeshee waxbarashada ugu dambeysay ee la qoray sida modelladan u kooban canshuuraha. Markaas waxan, si rasmi ah ayaannu si qaab ah u baranaynaa isticmaalka ku qorashada geedaha ku xiran ee loo beddelayo si horay loo tababariyey u beddelasho saddexda macluumaad ka soo bixinta: qayb semantic ah oo la magacaabay aqoonsiga entity iyo soo saaridda xiriirka. Waxaannu horumarinaynaa oo baaraynaa laba qoraal oo kala duduwan oo ku qoran dhismaha ku filan: qaabka dib u socda ee fuulashada, kaas oo ku habboonaya shabakadda neurada ee ka soo baxa bedelka, iyo qalabka wadajirka ah ee fuushanka, kaas oo ku hoosaysiiya dhismaha saxda ee isbedelka. Dhaqdhaqaaqyadaasu waa kuwa ka representa shaqada hore, laakiin waxaynu soo bandhignaa waxyaabo kale oo ku saabsan qoraalka, oo loo baahan yahay si loo helo sameynta horumarinta. Analyadeenna waxey muujiyaan in wareejisayaashan la isticmaalay ay helaan xaaladda farshaxanka ee SRL iyo shaqooyinka la soo saaro. Fasirkayagu wuxuu sidoo kale muuqanayaa mid gaaban oo muhiim ah, tusaalahan: waxaynu aragnaa in faa'iidadoodu aad u adag tahay in ay helaan baaritaanka ku xiran dadka-ku-dhibaataysan, taasoo sababto su'aalo muhiim ah oo la xiriira suurtagalka isbedelka ee dalabka caalamiga ah.", 'si': 'ගොඩක් අලුත් වැඩේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා වාක්ෂිත තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධතාවක් වලින් වාක්ෂිත තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ නමුත්, විශේෂයෙන් අවශ්\u200dය විශේෂතා ගස් තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය කරපු විදිහට ( මේ වැඩේ අපි පද්ධතියෙන් පද්ධතියෙන් අභ්\u200dයාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරනවා ප්\u200dරධාන තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරතිකාරිතාවක් තුනක් ප්\u200dරතිකාරිතාවක් ප්\u200dරතික අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න සහ පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධතා වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න සහ පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා: පරක්ෂිත වි මේ පරීක්ෂණාවල් ප්\u200dරධානය කලින් වැඩේ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපකයි, නමුත් අපි ප්\u200dරධානයක් වැඩ කරන්න අවශ්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාප අපේ ඉම්පිරිකාලික විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නයි මේ වාක්ෂාව ප්\u200dරවර්තනයක් SRL සහ සම්බන්ධ විශ්ලේෂණයක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා නමුත්, අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය තියෙන්නේ මේ මොඩේල්ස් ගැන විශේෂ අවස්ථාවක් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා: අපි හොයාගන්නවා ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ගොඩක් අවස්ථාවක් නිසා මිනිස්ස', 'sv': 'Mycket färskt arbete tyder på att införlivande av syntaxinformation från beroendeträd kan förbättra uppgiftsspecifika transformatormodeller. Effekten av att införliva information om beroendeträd i förutbildade transformatormodeller (t.ex. BERT) är dock oklar, särskilt med tanke på nyligen genomförda studier som belyser hur dessa modeller implicit kodar syntax. I detta arbete studerar vi systematiskt nyttan av att införliva beroendeträd i färdigutbildade transformatorer på tre representativa informationsutvinningsuppgifter: semantisk rollmärkning (SRL), namngiven entitetsigenkänning och relationsextraktion. Vi föreslår och undersöker två distinkta strategier för att införliva beroendestruktur: en sen fusionsmetod, som tillämpar ett grafneuralt nätverk på utgången av en transformator, och en gemensam fusionsmetod, som infunderar syntaxstruktur i transformatorns uppmärksamhetsskikt. Dessa strategier är representativa för tidigare arbete, men vi introducerar ytterligare modelldesignelement som är nödvändiga för att uppnå förbättrad prestanda. Vår empiriska analys visar att dessa syntaxinfunderade transformatorer erhåller toppmoderna resultat på SRL och relationsextraktionsuppgifter. Men vår analys avslöjar också en kritisk brist hos dessa modeller: vi finner att deras prestationsvinster är starkt beroende av tillgången på mänskligt kommenterade beroendetolkar, vilket väcker viktiga frågor om bärbarheten hos syntaxförstärkta transformatorer i verkliga applikationer.', 'ta': 'சார்பு மரங்களிலிருந்து ஒத்திசைவு தகவலை சேர்த்து செலுத்த முடியும் செயல் குறிப்பிட்ட மாற்று மாதிரிகளை மேம ஆனால், சார்பு மரத்தின் தகவலை முன் பயிற்சி மாற்ற மாதிரிகளில் சேர்த்து செலுத்தும் விளைவு இந்த வேலையில், நாம் முறைமையாக சார்ந்த மரங்களை சேர்த்து முன் பயிற்சியாக மாற்றங்களை மூன்று பிரதிநிதித்த தகவல் வெளியீட்டு பணிகளில் சேர்க்க பயன்படுத்துவத சார்பு அமைப்பை உள்ளிடுவதற்கான இரண்டு வித்தியாசமான திட்டங்களை நாம் பரிந்துரையும் செயல்படுத்துகிறோம். ஒரு தாமதமான குளியீட்டு மாற்றத்தின் வெளியீட்டில் வரைபடத்தி These strategies are representative of prior work, but we introduce additional model design elements that are necessary for obtaining improved performance.  நம்முடைய முக்கியமான ஆராய்ச்சி காண்பிக்கிறது இந்த ஒத்திசைந்து நுழைக்கப்பட்ட மாற்றங்கள் SRL மற்றும் தொடர்பு வெளியேற் ஆனாலும், எங்கள் ஆராய்ச்சி இந்த மாதிரிகளின் முக்கியமான குறைவினை வெளிப்படுத்துகிறது: நாங்கள் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம் அவர்களுடைய செயல்பாடுகள் மிகவும் தொடர்புடையது என்பது மனித-', 'sr': 'Mnogo nedavnog rada ukazuje na to da uključivanje sintaksičkih informacija iz drveća zavisnosti može poboljšati modele transformacije određenih zadataka. Međutim, učinak uključivanja informacija o drvetu zavisnosti u predobučene modele transformacije (npr. BERT) ostaje nepoznat, posebno s obzirom na nedavne studije koje naglašavaju kako ovi modeli implicitno kodiraju sintaks. U ovom poslu, sistematski proučavamo korisnost uključenja drveća zavisnosti u predobučene transformatore na tri predstavnog zadatka izvlačenja informacija: etiketiranje semantičke uloge (SRL), priznanje entiteta i izvlačenje odnosa. Predlažemo i istražujemo dve različite strategije za uključenje strukture zavisnosti: kasni pristup fuzije, koji primjenjuje graf neuralnu mrežu na izlazu transformatora, i zajednički pristup fuzije, koji infuzira sintaks strukturu u slojeve transformatora pažnje. Ove strategije predstavljaju prethodni rad, ali predstavljamo dodatne modele dizajnskih elementa koje su potrebne za dobivanje poboljšanih učinka. Naša empirička analiza pokazuje da ovi transformatori koji su infuzirani za sintaks dobijaju rezultate umjetnosti na SRL-u i izvlačenju odnosa. Međutim, naša analiza takođe otkriva kritično nedostatak ovih modela: smatramo da su njihovi dobiti učinkovitosti veoma važni na raspoloženosti analiza zavisnosti sa ljudima, koja podiže važna pitanja o životljivosti sintaksa povećanih transformatora u realnim aplikacijama.', 'no': 'Mange nyleg arbeid tyder på at inkludering av syntaksinformasjon frå avhengighetstrøk kan forbetra transformeringsmodeller for oppgåver spesifikke. Men effekten av å inkludere avhengighetstråinformasjon i føretrainerte transformeringsmodeller (f.eks. BERT) er ikkje ukjent, særleg gjeven nyleg studier som markerer korleis disse modelane implisitt kodar syntaks. I denne arbeida studerer vi systematisk verktøyet for å inkludere avhengighetstrøk til først trengte transformatorar på tre reprezentativ informasjonsekstraksjonsoppgåver: semantisk rolletiketting (SRL), namnet entitetskjenning og utpakking av relasjon. Vi foreslår og undersøker to spesifikke strategiar for å inkludere avhengighetsstrukturen: ein sein fjusjonstilnærming, som brukar eit grafennettverk på utdata av ein transformator, og ein felles fjusjonstilnærming, som infuserer syntaksstrukturen i transformeringsoppmerkslag. Desse strategiene er reprezentativ av førre arbeid, men vi introduserer fleire modellelement for design som er nødvendig for å få forbetra utvikling. Vårt empirisk analyse viser at desse syntaksinfuserte transformasjonane får tilstanden av kunsten på SRL- og relasjonsoppgåver. Analysen vårt viser også ein kritisk kortbruk av desse modelane: vi finn at utviklingane sine er svært avhengig av tilgjengeligheten av undersøkingsavhengighetsanalyser med menneske, som fører viktige spørsmål om gjennomføringen av syntaks-økte transformatorar i verkelege program.', 'ur': 'بہت اگلے کام کی توصیف کرتا ہے کہ اعتباری درختوں سے سینٹکس معلومات شامل کرنا کام کے مطابق تغییر معلومات کو بہتر کر سکتا ہے. However, the effect of incorporating dependency tree information into pre-trained transformer models (e.g. BERT) remains unclear, especially given recent studies highlighting how these models implicitly encode syntax. ہم اس کام میں سیستماتیک طور پر استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ اعتمادی درختوں کو پہلے تدریس کی تدریج کرنے والوں میں شامل کریں، تین نمایشن معلومات اضافہ کے کاموں میں: سیمنٹی رول لیبلینگ (SRL), نام دار واحد معلومات اور رابطہ اضافہ کریں۔ ہم نے دو مختلف استراتژیکوں کی پیشنهاد کریں اور تحقیق کریں کہ اعتباری ساختار کے ساتھ شامل ہونے کے لئے: ایک اچھی فوجین طریقہ، جو ایک تبدیل کرنے والے کے نتائج پر ایک گراف نیورال نیورل نیٹ ورک کو لازم کرتا ہے، اور ایک جوڑی فوجین طریقہ، جس نے سینٹکس ساختار کو تبدیل یہ استراتژی پہلے کے کام کی نمائندگی ہیں، لیکن ہم اضافہ نمائندہ ڈیزائن الگوں کو معرفی کرتے ہیں جو بہترین عمل حاصل کرنے کے لئے ضرورت ہیں. ہماری امپریکل تحقیقات دکھاتی ہے کہ یہ سینٹکس-نافذ تغییر کرنے والے SRL اور رابطہ نکلنے کے کاموں پر موجود رہتے ہیں. لیکن ہماری تحلیل بھی ان نمڈلوں کی ایک ضروری ناکامی ظاہر کرتی ہے: ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ ان کی عملکرد کمائی بہت اضافہ ہے انسان کی ناکامی پارس کے موجود ہونے پر، جو سینٹکس میں بڑھی ہوئی تبدیل کرنے والوں کی زندگی کے بارے میں اہم سوال اٹھاتے ہیں۔', 'vi': 'Những nghiên cứu gần đây cho thấy việc nhập thông tin cú pháp từ cây phụ thuộc có thể cải thiện các mô hình biến đặc nhiệm. Tuy nhiên, kết quả của việc nhúng thông tin phụ thuộc vào các mẫu máy biến đổi được huấn luyện trước (v. d. BERT) vẫn chưa rõ, đặc biệt là những nghiên cứu g ần đây đã làm sáng tỏ cách những mô hình này ngầm mã hóa cú pháp. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu tích cực về lợi ích của việc gia nhập những cây phụ thuộc vào những máy biến đổi được đào tạo trước ba nhiệm vụ khai thác thông tin đại diện: phân biệt khái niệm về vai, nhận dạng ủy nhiệm, và các mối quan hệ. Chúng tôi đề xuất và nghiên cứu hai chiến lược khác nhau để áp dụng cấu trúc phụ thuộc: một phương pháp nhiệt hạch trễ, áp dụng một mạng lưới thần kinh đồ thị dựa trên sản xuất của một máy biến đổi, và một phương pháp tổng hợp hợp hợp hợp hợp hợp, truyền vào cấu trúc cú pháp vào các lớp chú ý chuyển hóa. Những chiến lược này đại diện cho những công việc trước đây, nhưng chúng tôi đã đưa ra những yếu tố thiết kế khác cần thiết để đạt được hiệu suất tốt hơn. Sự phân tích bằng kinh nghiệm của chúng tôi chứng minh rằng những máy biến đổi này đạt được kết quả tối tân về công nghệ Sgiặt và các công việc khai thác mối quan hệ. Tuy nhiên, phân tích của chúng tôi cũng tiết lộ một thiếu sót nghiêm trọng trong những mô hình này: chúng tôi thấy lợi nhuận của chúng cực kỳ phụ thuộc vào khả năng có được các phân tích phụ thuộc vào người được ghi nhận, điều đó đặt ra những câu hỏi quan trọng về khả năng hoạt động của máy biến thế giới thực.', 'uz': "Yaqinda ko'pchilik ishni taʼminlovchi daraxtdan birlashtirish imkoniyatini anglatadi, vazifa- specific ўзгартириш modellarini oshirish mumkin. Lekin, birinchi taʼminlovchi transformer modellari (m.g. BERT) uchun ishlatilgan qoʻllanmalarning effekti notoʻg ʻri bo'ladi, ammo yaqinda ishlatilgan o'rganishlar bu modellar qanday sintaktika kodlash muvaffaqiyatli koʻrsatiladi. In this work, we systematically study the utility of incorporating dependency trees into pre-trained transformers on three representative information extraction tasks: semantic role labeling (SRL), named entity recognition, and relation extraction.  Biz tasavvur qilamiz va qo'shish tizimini qo'shish uchun ikkita boshqa strategini tahrirlash imkoniyatini tahrirlamiz: tez fuqarish usuli, shiftning natijasida grafik neyron tarmoqni qo'llash va bir bir bir bir qanchalik fusion usulida qo'llab chiqaradi, bu bir qanday bir qandaydir o'zgartirish qatlamga qo Bu strategiyalar oldin ishni taqdimot qiladi, lekin biz yaxshi bajarish uchun qoʻshimcha model dizayning elementlarini anglatamiz. Bizning imkoniyatli analytikimizni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, bu sintaktik-inffoydalanilgan ўзгаришлаrning SRL va taxminan tashkilotlarning holati sohasini olib tashlaydi. Lekin, bizning analytikimiz bu modellarning muhim qisqartmalarni ko'rsatadi: biz ularning amalning natijalari imkoniyatini o'rganishga juda muhim imkoniyatli deb o'ylaymiz. Bu muammo savollarini haqida qo'shishga qo'shiladi.", 'da': 'Meget nyligt arbejde tyder på, at indarbejdelse af syntaksoplysninger fra afhængighedstræer kan forbedre opgavespecifikke transformatormodeller. Effekten af at indarbejde afhængighedstræinformation i præ-trænede transformatormodeller (f.eks. BERT) er imidlertid uklar, især i betragtning af nylige undersøgelser, der fremhæver, hvordan disse modeller implicit koder syntaks. I dette arbejde undersøger vi systematisk nytten af at inkorporere afhængighedstræer i prætrænede transformatorer på tre repræsentative informationsudvindingsopgaver: semantisk rollemærkning (SRL), navngivet entitetsgenkendelse og relationsudvinding. Vi foreslår og undersøger to forskellige strategier for at indarbejde afhængighedsstruktur: en sen fusionsmetode, der anvender et grafneuralt netværk på udgangen af en transformer, og en fælles fusionsmetode, der indfører syntaksstruktur i transformatorens opmærksomhedslag. Disse strategier er repræsentative for tidligere arbejde, men vi introducerer yderligere modeldesignelementer, der er nødvendige for at opnå forbedret ydeevne. Vores empiriske analyse viser, at disse syntaks-infuserede transformatorer opnår state-of-the-art resultater på SRL og relationsudvindingsopgaver. Vores analyse afslører imidlertid også en kritisk mangel ved disse modeller: Vi finder, at deres ydeevne gevinster i høj grad er betinget af tilgængeligheden af menneskelige-annoterede afhængighedsparser, hvilket rejser vigtige spørgsmål vedrørende levedygtigheden af syntaks-forstærkede transformere i virkelige applikationer.', 'hr': 'Mnogo nedavnog rada ukazuje na to da uključivanje sintaksnih informacija iz drveća zavisnosti može poboljšati modele transformacije određenih zadataka. Međutim, učinak uključivanja informacija o zavisnosti drveta u predobučene modele transformacije (npr. BERT) ostaje nepoznat, posebno s obzirom na nedavna ispitivanja koji naglašavaju kako te modele implicitno kodiraju sintaks. U ovom poslu, sistematski proučavamo korisnost uključenja drveća zavisnosti u predobučene transformatore na tri predstavnog zadatka izvlačenja informacija: označavanje semantičke uloge (SRL), priznanje entiteta i izvlačenje odnosa. Predlažemo i istražujemo dvije različite strategije za uključenje strukture ovisnosti: kasni pristup fuzije, koji primjenjuje graf neuronsku mrežu na izlazu transformatora, i zajednički pristup fuzije, koji infuzira sintaksičku strukturu u slojeve pozornosti transformatora. Ove strategije predstavljaju prethodni rad, ali predstavljamo dodatne elemente dizajna koji su potrebni za dobivanje poboljšanog učinka. Naša empirička analiza pokazuje da ovi transformatori koji su infuzirani za sintaks dobijaju rezultate umjetnosti na SRL-u i izvlačenja odnosa. Međutim, naša analiza također pokazuje kritično nedostatak ovih modela: smatramo da su njihovi dobiti učinkovitosti veoma važni na raspoloživosti analiza ovisnosti u ljudima, koja podiže važna pitanja o živototnosti sintaksima povećanih transformatora u stvarnom svijetu.', 'nl': 'Veel recent onderzoek suggereert dat het opnemen van syntaxisinformatie uit afhankelijkheidsbomen taakspecifieke transformatormodellen kan verbeteren. Het effect van het opnemen van afhankelijkheidsboominformatie in vooraf getrainde transformatormodellen (bijv. BERT) blijft echter onduidelijk, vooral gezien recente studies die aantonen hoe deze modellen impliciet syntaxis coderen. In dit werk bestuderen we systematisch het nut van het integreren van afhankelijkheidsbomen in voorgetrainde transformatoren op drie representatieve informatie extractie taken: semantische role labeling (SRL), named entity herkenning en relatieontwikkeling. We stellen twee verschillende strategieën voor het integreren van afhankelijkheidsstructuur voor: een late fusie benadering, die een grafiek neuraal netwerk toepast op de output van een transformator, en een gezamenlijke fusie benadering, die syntaxis structuur in de transformatorattentielagen infuseert. Deze strategieën zijn representatief voor eerdere werkzaamheden, maar we introduceren aanvullende modelontwerpelementen die nodig zijn voor het verkrijgen van verbeterde prestaties. Onze empirische analyse toont aan dat deze syntaxis-geïnfuseerde transformatoren state-of-the-art resultaten verkrijgen op SRL- en relatieontwikkelingstaken. Onze analyse toont echter ook een kritieke tekortkoming aan van deze modellen: we constateren dat hun prestatiewinst sterk afhankelijk is van de beschikbaarheid van door mensen geannoteerde afhankelijkheidsparsen, wat belangrijke vragen oproept over de levensvatbaarheid van syntaxis-augmented transformatoren in real-world toepassingen.', 'bg': 'Много скорошни работи предполагат, че включването на синтаксисна информация от дърветата за зависимост може да подобри специфичните за задачата трансформаторни модели. Въпреки това ефектът от включването на информация за дървото на зависимостта в предварително обучените трансформаторни модели (напр. BERT) остава неясен, особено предвид последните проучвания, подчертаващи как тези модели имплицитно кодират синтаксиса. В тази работа систематично изучаваме ползата от включването на дървета на зависимостта в предварително обучени трансформатори по три представителни задачи за извличане на информация: семантично етикетиране на роли (наричано разпознаване на обекти и извличане на релации. Предлагаме и изследваме две различни стратегии за включване на структурата на зависимостта: подход за късен синтез, който прилага графична невронна мрежа върху изхода на трансформатор, и подход за съвместно синтез, който влива синтаксисната структура в слоевете на вниманието на трансформатора. Тези стратегии са представителни за предишна работа, но ние въвеждаме допълнителни елементи на дизайна на модела, които са необходими за постигане на подобрена производителност. Нашият емпиричен анализ показва, че тези трансформатори, инфузирани със синтаксис, получават най-съвременни резултати по задачите за извличане на връзки и др. Анализът ни обаче разкрива и критичен недостатък на тези модели: откриваме, че повишаването на производителността им зависи силно от наличието на анализа на зависимостта с анотация на човека, което повдига важни въпроси относно жизнеспособността на трансформаторите, увеличени със синтаксис в реални приложения.', 'de': 'Viele aktuelle Arbeiten deuten darauf hin, dass die Integration von Syntaxinformationen aus Abhängigkeitsbäumen aufgabenspezifische Transformatormodelle verbessern kann. Der Effekt der Einbindung von Abhängigkeitsbauminformationen in vortrainierte Transformatormodelle (z.B. BERT) bleibt jedoch unklar, insbesondere angesichts aktueller Studien, die zeigen, wie diese Modelle implizit Syntax kodieren. In dieser Arbeit untersuchen wir systematisch den Nutzen der Integration von Abhängigkeitsbäumen in vortrainierte Transformatoren auf drei repräsentativen Informationsextraktionsaufgaben: semantische Rollenbeschriftung (SRL), benannte Entitätenerkennung und Beziehungsextraktion. Wir schlagen zwei verschiedene Strategien für die Integration von Abhängigkeitsstrukturen vor: einen Spätfusionsansatz, der ein neuronales Graphennetzwerk auf den Ausgang eines Transformators anwendet, und einen Joint Fusion Ansatz, der Syntaxstruktur in die Transformatoraufmerksamkeitsschichten infundiert. Diese Strategien sind repräsentativ für frühere Arbeiten, aber wir führen zusätzliche Modellentwurfselemente ein, die für eine verbesserte Leistung erforderlich sind. Unsere empirische Analyse zeigt, dass diese syntax-infundierten Transformatoren aktuelle Ergebnisse zu SRL- und Beziehungsextraktionsaufgaben erhalten. Unsere Analyse zeigt jedoch auch ein kritisches Manko dieser Modelle auf: Wir stellen fest, dass ihre Leistungszuwächse stark von der Verfügbarkeit von human-annotierten Abhängigkeitsparsen abhängen, was wichtige Fragen hinsichtlich der Rentabilität von syntax-augmented Transformatoren in realen Anwendungen aufwirft.', 'id': 'Much recent work suggests that incorporating syntax information from dependency trees can improve task-specific transformer models.  Namun, efek dari inkorporasi informasi pohon dependensi ke model transformer pra-terlatih (contohnya BERT) tetap tidak jelas, terutama mengingat studi-studi baru-baru ini menyatakan bagaimana model ini secara implicit mengkode sintaks. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami secara sistematis mempelajari utilitas untuk memasukkan pohon dependensi ke transformator yang terlatih sebelumnya pada tiga tugas ekstraksi informasi yang mewakili: label peran semantis (SRL), pengenal entitas bernama, dan ekstraksi hubungan. Kami mengusulkan dan menyelidiki dua strategi yang berbeda untuk mengikorporasi struktur dependensi: pendekatan fusi terlambat, yang menerapkan jaringan saraf grafik pada output dari transformer, dan pendekatan fusi kongsi, yang menginspirasi struktur sintaks ke lapisan perhatian transformer. These strategies are representative of prior work, but we introduce additional model design elements that are necessary for obtaining improved performance.  Analisi empirik kami menunjukkan bahwa transformer sintaks ini mendapatkan hasil terbaik pada SRL dan tugas ekstraksi hubungan. Namun, analisis kami juga mengungkapkan kekurangan kritis dari model-model ini: kami menemukan bahwa keuntungan prestasi mereka sangat tergantung pada disponibilitas analisis dependensi yang dicatat oleh manusia, yang mengakibatkan pertanyaan penting mengenai kebolehan transformer yang meningkat sintaks dalam aplikasi dunia nyata.', 'sw': 'Kazi nyingi za hivi karibuni inapendekeza kuwa kuingiza taarifa za kodi kutoka kwenye miti ya kutegemea kunaweza kuboresha mifano maalum ya mabadiliko ya kazi. Hata hivyo, madhara ya kuingiza taarifa za kutegemea mti katika mifano ya mabadiliko ya awali (kwa mfano, BERT) bado si wazi, hasa kwa sababu ya utafiti wa hivi karibuni unaonyesha jinsi mifano hii inavyoweka wazi kodi. Katika kazi hii, tunachunguza matumizi ya kuingiza miti ya kutegemea kuwa mabadiliko ya awali ya mafunzo ya awali kuhusu kazi tatu za utekelezaji wa taarifa: jukumu la kimapenzi (SRL), linaloitwa kutambua entity, na utoaji wa mahusiano. Tunazipendekeza na kuchunguza mbinu mbili tofauti kwa ajili ya kuingiza muundo wa kutegemea: mbinu za uchimbaji wa baadae, ambazo zinatumia mtandao wa picha ya neurali kwenye matokeo ya mabadiliko, na mbinu za pamoja za migogoro, ambazo zinatumia muundo wa syntax katika vipengele vya mabadiliko. Mipango hii ni mwakilishi wa kazi za awali, lakini tunaonyesha vifaa vingine vya ubunifu vinavyohitajika ili kupata ufanisi mzuri. Uchambuzi wetu wa msisitizo unaonyesha kuwa mabadiliko haya yanayotumiwa na usambazaji wa kodi hupata matokeo ya aina ya sanaa kwenye kazi za SRL na kutengeneza mahusiano. Hata hivyo, uchambuzi wetu pia unaonyesha ukosefu wa ukosoaji wa mifano hii: tunaona kwamba mafanikio yao yanahusiana sana na upatikanaji wa mabadiliko yanayotegemea binadamu, ambayo yanaibua maswali muhimu kuhusiana na uwezekano wa mabadiliko yanayoongezwa na kodi katika matumizi ya dunia halisi.', 'ko': '최근의 많은 작업에서 트리에 의존하는 문법 정보를 통합하면 작업에 특정한 변환기 모델을 개선할 수 있다는 것을 보여 준다.그러나 트리 정보에 의존하여 미리 훈련된 변환기 모델(예를 들어 BERT)에 통합하는 효과는 여전히 명확하지 않다. 특히 최근 이러한 모델이 어떻게 은식 인코딩 문법을 강조하는지를 고려한 연구이다.이 작업에서 우리는 의존 트리를 미리 훈련된 변환기에 통합시켜 대표적인 세 가지 정보 추출 임무에 대한 효용을 체계적으로 연구했다. 그것이 바로 의미 역할 표시(SRL), 명명 실체 식별과 관계 추출이다.우리는 두 가지 서로 다른 합병 의존 구조의 전략을 제시하고 연구했다. 후기 융합 방법(도형신경 네트워크를 변환기의 출력에 응용)과 연합 융합 방법(문법 구조를 변환기 주의층에 주입하는 것)이다.이러한 전략은 이전의 업무를 대표하지만 우리는 추가 모델 설계 요소를 도입했는데 이런 요소들은 더욱 좋은 성능을 얻는 데 필요한 것이다.우리의 실증 분석에 의하면 이러한 문법을 주입하는 변환기는 SRL과 관계 추출 작업에서 가장 선진적인 결과를 얻었다.그러나 우리의 분석은 이러한 모델의 관건적인 단점을 제시했다. 우리는 그들의 성능 향상은 어느 정도에 인류 주석이 해석에 의존하는 가용성에 달려 있다는 것을 발견했다. 그래서 문법 강화 변환기가 실제 응용에서의 타당성에 대한 중요한 문제를 제기했다.', 'fa': 'کارهای خیلی اخیر پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که شامل اطلاعات سنتاکس از درختان بستگی می\u200cتواند مدلهای تغییر دهنده خاص کار را بهتر کند. ولی تاثیر تغییر دادن اطلاعات درخت بستگی به مدل های تغییر آموزش پیش آموزش داده شده (مثال BERT) بی\u200cخبر است، مخصوصاً تحقیقات اخیراً که نشان داده\u200cاند چگونه این مدل\u200cها به طور اخلاقی تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cی سینتکس را در این کار، ما سیستم\u200cپذیری از استفاده از درختان بستگی به تغییردهندگان پیش آموزش داده شده\u200cایم بر سه کار اخراج اطلاعات نماینده: برچسب نقش semantic role (SRL), شناسایی عنوان یک entity و اخراج ارتباط. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم و تحقیق می\u200cکنیم دو استراتژی مختلف برای شامل ساختار بستگی: یک دستور فشار دیر، که شبکه عصبی را بر نتیجه یک تغییر دهنده، و یک دستور فشار متفاوت، که ساختار سینتکس را در لایه توجه تغییر دهنده می\u200cکند. این استراتژی ها نماینده کارهای قبلی هستند، ولی ما عناصر طراحی مدل اضافی را معرفی می کنیم که نیازی دارند برای پیدا کردن عملکرد بهتر. تحلیل امپراطوری ما نشان می دهد که این تغییردهندگان متغییر استفاده شده از سنتاکس نتیجه\u200cهای موجود هنر در مورد وظیفه\u200cهای SRL و ارتباط اخراج می\u200cکنند. با این وجود، تحلیل ما نیز یک کمینه جدی از این مدلها را نشان می دهد: ما می یابیم که پیروزی عملکرد آنها بسیار مسئله در دسترسی تحلیل بستگی به انسان نشان داده شده است، که سوال مهم را درباره زندگی قابلیت تغییر دهندگان سنتاکس در کاربردهای دنیای واقعی بالا می برد.', 'am': 'ከቅርብ ዘመን ጀምሮ የሲንካስር መረጃዎችን ከመጠቀም የተጠቃሚ ዛፎች የስራ-specific ለውጥ ዓይነቶችን ማሻሻል ይችላል፡፡ However, the effect of incorporating dependency tree information into pre-trained transformer models (e.g., BERT) remains unclear, especially given recent studies highlighting how these models implicitly encode syntax.  በዚህ ሥራ፣ በተስማማማሚ ሥርዓት የአስተማሪ ዛፎችን ለመቀበል የሦስት የፖለቲካ መረጃ ውጤት ማውጣት ስራዎችን ለመቀላቀል እናስተምር:: አካል ማውቀት እና የግንኙነት ማውቀት የሚባል የsemantic role labeling (SRL). በሁለት የተለየ ጥያቄዎችን ለመግጠም እና ለመፍጠር እና ለመፍጠር እናደርጋለን፡፡ እነዚህ ተቃውሞዎች አስቀድሞ ሥራ ላይ የሚቆጠሩ ናቸው፤ ነገር ግን የበለጠ ጥናት ለማግኘት የሚያስፈልገውን ጨዋታውን የሞዴል አካልም እናቀርባለን፡፡ የአምላካዊ ትምህርታችን ይህ የሲንካስብ-የተጠቃሚ ለውጦችን SRL እና የግንኙነት ስራ ላይ የ-art ውጤቶች እንዲያገኙ ያስታያል፡፡ ነገር ግን analysያችን እነዚህን ዓይነቶች የሚያስቆርጥ ግንኙነት እናስታውቃለን፤ የድረስነታቸው ግንኙነት በሰው-አካባቢ በተደገመ ፓርላማ ላይ እጅግ አግኝቷል፡፡', 'af': "Baie onlangse werk stel voorstel dat die inkorporering van sintaks inligting van afhanklikheidsboom van taak spesifieke transformeermodele kan verbeter. Maar die effek van die inkorporeer van afhanklikheidsboom inligting in vooraf-opgelei transformeermodele (bv. BERT) bly onbekende, veral gegee onlangse studie verligting hoe hierdie modele inplisite sintaks kodeer. In hierdie werk ondersoek ons systematies die nutsprogram van die inkorporeer van afhanklikheidsboom in voorafgeleerde transformeerders op drie reprezentante inligting uittrekking opdragte: semantiese roletiketing (SRL), genaamde entiteiterkenning en verhouding van uittrekking. Ons voorstel en ondersoek twee verskillende strategies vir inkorporering van afhanklikheid struktuur: â\x80\x99n laat fusie toegang, wat toewend 'n graaf neuralnetwerk op die uitvoer van â\x80\x99n transformeerder, en â\x80\x99n joint fusie toegang, wat sintaks struktuur in die transformeerder aandag laag infruik. Hierdie strategies is voorafinstelling van voorheede werk, maar ons introduseer addisionele model ontwerp elemente wat nodig is vir verbeterde prestasie te kry. Ons empiriese analisie vertoon dat hierdie sintaks-infused transformeerders staat-van-kuns-resultate op SRL en verwante uittrekking-opdragte kry. Ons analisie verduidelik ook 'n kritiese kortpaak van hierdie modele: ons vind dat hulle voorwerp is baie aangehandel op die beskikbaarheid van die beskikbaarheid van mens-annotateerde afhanklikheidsversoeke, wat belangrik vrae verwek aangaande die lewendigheid van sintaks-vergroot transformeerders in reël-wêreld toepassings.", 'sq': 'Puna shumë e fundit sugjeron se përfshirja e informacionit sintaks nga pemët e varësisë mund të përmirësojë modelet e transformuesve specifikë për detyrat. Megjithatë, efekti i përfshirjes së informacionit të drurit të varësisë në modelet e transformuesve të paratrajnuar (për shembull BERT) mbetet i paqartë, veçanërisht duke pasur parasysh studimet e fundit që theksojnë se si këto modele kodojnë implicitisht sintaksin. Në këtë punë, ne studiojmë sistematikisht utilitetin e përfshirjes së pemëve të varësisë në transformuesit e paratrajnuar në tre detyra përfaqësuese të nxjerrjes së informacionit: etiketat semantike të rolit (SRL), njohjen e emëruar të njësisë dhe nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve. Ne propozojmë dhe hetojmë dy strategji të veçanta për përfshirjen e strukturës së varësisë: një qasje e fundit të fuzionit, e cila aplikon një rrjet nervor grafik në daljen e një transformuesi, dhe një qasje të përbashkët të fuzionit, e cila fut strukturën sintakse në shtresa të vëmendjes së transformuesit. Këto strategji janë përfaqësuese të punës së mëparshme, por ne futim elemente shtesë modeli dizajni që janë të nevojshme për të arritur performancë të përmirësuar. Analiza jonë empirike tregon se këta transformatorë të infuzuar me sintaksi marrin rezultate të moderne në SRL dhe detyrat e nxjerrjes së marrëdhënieve. Megjithatë, analiza jonë zbulon gjithashtu një mungesë kritike të këtyre modeleve: ne zbulojmë se fitimet e tyre të performancës janë shumë të varura nga dispozicioni i analizave të varësisë të anotuara nga njerëzit, që ngre pyetje të rëndësishme lidhur me jetueshmërinë e transformuesve të rritur nga sintaksi në aplikimet e botës reale.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক কাজ পরামর্শ প্রদান করেছে যে নির্ভরশীল গাছ থেকে সিন্ক্যাক্স তথ্য যোগাযোগ করা যায়, কাজ-নির্দিষ্ট পরি তবে পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত পরিবর্তন মডেল (যেমন বিআরটি) নির্ভরশীল গাছের তথ্য যোগাযোগ করার প্রভাব এখনো পরিষ্কার, বিশেষ করে সাম্প্রতিক গবেষণাগুলোতে বিশেষ করে  এই কাজে আমরা সিস্টেমিক ভাবে গবেষণা করি যে পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত গাছগুলোকে প্রতিনিধিত্বিত তথ্য বিনিময়ের কাজের উপর নির্ভরশীল পরিবর্তন করার ব্যবহারের ব্যবহার করা হয়: সেমে নির্ভরশীল কাঠামোর মধ্যে যোগ দেওয়ার জন্য আমরা দুটি বিভিন্ন কৌশল পরীক্ষা করি এবং তদন্ত করি: একটি দেরি ফ্লুশন কৌশল, যা একটি পরিবর্তনের আউটপুটে গ্রাফ্রাফ নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক প্রয়ো এই কৌশলগুলো পূর্ববর্তী কাজের প্রতিনিধিত্ব, কিন্তু আমরা আরো মোডেল ডিজাইন উপাদানের পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি যা উন্নত করার প্রয়োজন। আমাদের সম্মানজনক বিশ্লেষণ প্রদর্শন করে যে এই সিন্ক্যাক্স-ইনফ্রাস্ট্রান্সফর্মারগুলো এসআরএল এবং সম্পর্ক বের করার কাজে রাষ্ট্র However, our analysis also reveals a critical shortcoming of these models: we find that their performance gains are highly contingent on the availability of human-annotated dependency parses, which raises important questions regarding the viability of syntax-augmented transformers in real-world applications.', 'tr': 'Ýakynda köp işe daşary agaçlardan sintaks maglumatyny daşary etmek üçin täze hili täsirli transformer nusgalaryny geliştirebilir. Ýöne, baglanylyk maglumatyny öňünden e ğlenen transformer nusgalaryna (örän BERT) dahyl etmeli bolar. Özellikde soňky aramalar bu nusgalaryň nähili kodlaýandygyny ýagtylamaklyklary berilýär. Bu işde, biz sistematik görnüş agaçlaryň baglaryny öňünden okuwçylar bilen üýtgetmek üç temel informasiýa açmak işinde esasy taýýarlamak üçin ullanlygyny öwrenip barýarys. Biz bağlılık strukturyny dahil etmek üçin iki farklı strateji teklif edip, soruşturmayı teklif edip, geç bir birleşme metodu. Bu transformatörün çizgisinde grafik nöral a ğ uygular ve bir birleşme metodu. Bu stratejiýalar öň öňki işiň temsilcisidir, ýöne biz gowulaşdyrylmagyň üçin gerek dodag nusga düzenleme elementlerini tanyşdyrýarys. Biziň empirik analýusymyz bu syntaks-infusiýaly transformatçylaryň SRL we haýsyzlyk çekişmegi üçin stat-of-the-art netijesini aldygyny görkezýär. Ýöne biziň analýşimiz bu modelleriň wajyp ýok bolmagyny görkezýär: ukyplarynyň gazanlyklarynyň, ynsan-täsirli baglanylyk analysiýasynyň tapylygynda örän möhüm soraglary çykarýar. Bu şekilde sintaks-täsirli üýtgeden transformasiýatlaryň ýakynlygyny we dünýäde tapawu', 'hy': "Շատ վերջին աշխատանքներ ցույց են տալիս, որ կախվածության ծառերի սինտաքսի ինֆորմացիայի ներառումը կարող է բարելավել խնդիրների հատուկ վերափոխման մոդելները: However, the effect of incorporating dependency tree information into pre-trained transformer models (e.g., BERT) remains unclear, especially given recent studies highlighting how these models implicitly encode syntax.  Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք սիստեմատիկ ուսումնասիրում ենք կախվածության ծառերի ներառման օգտակարությունը նախապատրաստված վերափոխողների մեջ երեք ներկայացուցիչ տեղեկատվության վերացման խնդիրների վրա. սեմանտիկ դերի պիտակ (SSL), անվանված էության ճանաչելու և հարաբերությունների վեր Մենք առաջարկում ենք և ուսումնասիրում ենք կախվածության կառուցվածքի ներգրավման երկու առանձնահատուկ ռազմավարություններ' ուշ ֆուզիոնային մոտեցում, որը կիրառում է գծագրային նյարդային ցանց վերափոխողի արտադրման վրա, և միասին ֆուզիոնային մոտեցում, որը ներդնում է սի These strategies are representative of prior work, but we introduce additional model design elements that are necessary for obtaining improved performance.  Մեր էմպրիկական վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ այս սինտաքսի ներդրված վերափոխողները ստանում են նորագույն արդյունքներ SSL-ի և հարաբերությունների վերացման խնդիրների վրա: Այնուամենայնիվ, մեր վերլուծությունը բացահայտում է նաև այս մոդելների կարևոր բացակայությունը. մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ նրանց արտադրողականության բարձրացումը շատ կախված է մարդկային նկարագրված կախվածության վերլուծումների հասանելիության վրա, ինչը առաջացնում է կարևոր հարցեր, որոնք կապված են սինտաքսի բարձրացված վեր", 'ca': "Molta feina recent suggereix que incorporar informació de sintaxi dels arbres de dependencia pot millorar els models de transformador específics per a les tasques. No obstant això, l'efecte de l'incorporació de la informació sobre l'arbre de dependencia en models de transformadors pré-entrenats (per exemple BERT) encara no és clar, especialment en vista d'estudis recents que destaquen com aquests models codifiquen implícitament la sintaxi. En aquesta feina, estudiem sistemàticament l'utilitat d'incorporar arbres de dependencia en transformadors pré-entrenats en tres tasques representatives d'extracció d'informació: etiquetar el paper semàntic (SRL), anomenat reconeixement d'entitats, i extracció de relacions. Proposem i investigam dues estratègies diferents per incorporar l'estructura de dependencia: un enfocament de la tardiva fusió, que aplica una xarxa neural gràfica a la producció d'un transformador, i un enfocament de la fusió conjunta, que infusa l'estructura de sintaxi a les capes d'atenció del transformador. Aquestes estratègies són representatives del treball anterior, però introduïm elements adicionals de disseny model que són necessaris per aconseguir un rendiment millorat. La nostra anàlisi empírica demostra que aquests transformadors infusionats amb sintaxis obtenen resultats més avançats en SRL i tasques d'extracció de relacions. Tot i així, la nostra anàlisi també revela una deficiència crítica d'aquests models: descobrim que els seus guanys de rendiment estan molt dependents de la disponibilitat d'analistes de dependencia anotats per humans, que planteix qüestions importants sobre la viabilitat de transformadors incrementats per sintaxis en aplicacions del món real.", 'az': 'Əvvəlki işdə çox sintaks məlumatlarını bağımlılıq ağaclarından daxil etmək işin müəyyən edilmiş transformer modellerini daha yaxşılaşdırır. Lakin, bağımlılıq ağacının məlumatını ön təhsil edilmiş transformer modellerinə qatmaq təsiri (bənzər BERT) səbəbi sonrakı təhsil edilmişdir, özlərinə də son təhsil edilmişdir ki, bu modellərin sintaksi necə kodlandığını işıqlandırır. Bu işdə, biz sistematik olaraq bağımlılıq ağaclarını üç temsilci məlumat ekstraksiyası işarələrində əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş transformatörlərə birləşdirmək üçün istifadəsini təhsil edirik: semantik rol etiketi (SRL), adı verilmiş bir məlumat tanıması və əlaqə çıxarması. Biz bağımlılıq strukturlarını birləşdirmək üçün iki müxtəlif strateji təbliğ edirik və araşdırarıq: gecikli fəsasiya metodu, transformatörünün çıxımında grafik nöral şəbəkəsini uyğunlayır, və birləşdirilmiş fəsasiya metodu, sintaks strukturlarını transformatör səviyyələrinə infusiya edər. Bu stratejilər əvvəlki işin temsilcisidir, amma biz yaxşılıqlarını qazanmaq üçün ehtiyacı olan dodatlı model dizayn elementlərini tanıyırıq. Bizim empirik analizimiz bu sintaks-infused transformatörlərin SRL və əlaqəsi çıxartma işlərinin stat-of-the-art sonuçlarını aldığını göstərir. Ancaq analizimiz də bu modellərin kritik küfrünü göstərir: onların performans qazandıqlarını gerçek dünya proqramlarında sintaks artırılmış transformatörlərin yaşamlılığı haqqında çox möhkəm suallar yaratdığını görürük.', 'et': 'Paljud hiljutised tööd näitavad, et sõltuvuspuude süntaksiteabe lisamine võib parandada ülesandepõhiseid transformaatorite mudeleid. Kuid sõltuvuspuu teabe lisamise mõju eelnevalt väljaõpetatud trafomodellidesse (nt BERT) on ebaselge, eriti arvestades hiljutisi uuringuid, milles rõhutatakse, kuidas need mudelid kaudselt kodeerivad süntaksit. Käesolevas töös uurime süstemaatiliselt sõltuvuspuude eelnevalt koolitatud trafodesse lisamise kasulikkust kolmel representatiivsel info ekstraheerimisülesandel: semantiline rolli märgistamine (SRL), nimetatud olemi tuvastamine ja seoste ekstraheerimine. Pakume välja ja uurime kahte erinevat strateegiat sõltuvusstruktuuri integreerimiseks: hilise fusiooni lähenemine, mis rakendab trafo väljundile graafilist neurovõrku, ja ühisfusiooni lähenemine, mis infundeerib süntaksi struktuuri trafo tähelepanu kihtidesse. Need strateegiad esindavad varasemat tööd, kuid me tutvustame täiendavaid mudeli disaini elemente, mis on vajalikud parema jõudluse saavutamiseks. Meie empiiriline analüüs näitab, et need süntaksiga infundeeritud trafod saavad kaasaegseid tulemusi SRL ja seoste ekstraheerimise ülesannete kohta. Meie analüüsist ilmneb aga ka nende mudelite kriitiline puudus: leiame, et nende jõudluse suurenemine sõltub suuresti inimese märgitud sõltuvuse parsimise kättesaadavusest, mis tõstatab olulised küsimused süntaksiga suurendatud trafode elujõulisuse kohta reaalmaailma rakendustes.', 'bs': 'Mnogo nedavnog rada ukazuje na to da uključivanje sintaksičkih informacija iz drveća zavisnosti može poboljšati modele transformacije određenih zadataka. Međutim, učinak uključivanja informacija o drvetu zavisnosti u predobučene modele transformacije (npr. BERT) ostaje nejasno, posebno s obzirom na nedavne studije koje naglašavaju kako te modele implicitno kodiraju sintaks. U ovom poslu, sistematski proučavamo korisnost uključenja drveća zavisnosti u predobučene transformatore na tri predstavnog zadatka izvlačenja informacija: etiketiranje semantičke uloge (SRL), priznanje entiteta i izvlačenje odnosa. Mi predlažemo i istražujemo dve različite strategije za uključenje strukture zavisnosti: kasni pristup fuzije, koji primjenjuje graf neuralnu mrežu na izlazu transformatora, i zajednički pristup fuzije, koji infuzira sintaks strukturu u slojeve pažnje transformatora. Ove strategije predstavljaju prethodni rad, ali predstavljamo dodatne modelne elemente dizajna koje su potrebne za dobivanje poboljšanog učinka. Naša empirička analiza pokazuje da ovi transformatori koji su infuzirani za sintaks dobijaju rezultate umjetnosti na SRL-u i izvlačenju odnosa. Međutim, naša analiza također otkriva kritično nedostatak ovih modela: smatramo da su njihovi dobiti učinkovitosti veoma važni na raspoloživosti analiza ovisnosti u ljudima, koja podiže važna pitanja o životljivosti sintaksa povećanih transformatora u stvarnom svijetu.', 'fi': 'Monet viimeaikaiset tutkimukset viittaavat siihen, että riippuvuuspuiden syntaksitietojen yhdistäminen voi parantaa tehtäväkohtaisia muuntajamalleja. Riippuvuuspuun tietojen sisällyttäminen esikoulutettuihin muuntajamalleihin (esim. BERT) on kuitenkin edelleen epäselvää, varsinkin kun otetaan huomioon viimeaikaiset tutkimukset, joissa korostetaan, miten nämä mallit implisiittisesti koodaavat syntaksia. Tässä työssä tutkitaan systemaattisesti riippuvuuspuiden liittämisen hyödyllisyyttä esikoulutettuihin muuntajiin kolmessa representatiivisessa tiedonlouhintatehtävässä: semanttinen roolimerkintä (SRL), nimetty entiteettitunnistus ja relaatiouutto. Ehdotamme ja tutkimme kahta erilaista strategiaa riippuvuusrakenteen integroimiseksi: myöhäisen fuusion lähestymistapaa, joka soveltaa graafista neuroverkkoa muuntajan ulostuloon, ja yhteisfuusion lähestymistapaa, joka infusoi syntaksirakenteen muuntajan huomiokerroksiin. Nämä strategiat edustavat aikaisempaa työtä, mutta esittelemme lisää mallisuunnitteluelementtejä, jotka ovat tarpeen suorituskyvyn parantamiseksi. Empiirinen analyysimme osoittaa, että nämä syntaksilla infusoidut muuntajat saavat viimeisintä tekniikkaa SRL- ja relaatiouuttotehtävissä. Analyysimme kuitenkin paljastaa myös näiden mallien kriittisen puutteen: havaitsemme, että niiden suorituskykyhyödyt riippuvat suuresti ihmisen merkitsemien riippuvuusparsien saatavuudesta, mikä herättää tärkeitä kysymyksiä syntaksilla lisättyjen muuntajien elinkelpoisuudesta reaalimaailman sovelluksissa.', 'cs': 'Mnohé nedávné práce naznačují, že začlenění syntaxi informací ze stromů závislostí může zlepšit modely transformátorů specifických pro úlohy. Účinek začlenění informací o stromu závislosti do předem trénovaných transformátorových modelů (např. BERT) však zůstává nejasný, zejména vzhledem k nedávným studiím, které zdůrazňují, jak tyto modely implicitně kódují syntaxi. V této práci systematicky studujeme užitečnost začlenění závislostních stromů do předškolených transformátorů na třech reprezentativních úkolech extrakce informací: sémantické označování rolí (SRL), rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit a extrakci relací. Navrhujeme a zkoumáme dvě odlišné strategie pro začlenění závislostní struktury: pozdní fúzní přístup, který aplikuje grafovou neuronovou síť na výstup transformátoru, a společný fúzní přístup, který vkládá syntaxi strukturu do vrstev pozornosti transformátoru. Tyto strategie jsou reprezentativní pro předchozí práci, ale představujeme další prvky návrhu modelu, které jsou nezbytné pro získání lepšího výkonu. Naše empirická analýza ukazuje, že tyto syntaxiční transformátory získávají nejmodernější výsledky v oblasti SRL a extrakce vztahů. Naše analýza však také odhaluje kritický nedostatek těchto modelů: zjišťujeme, že jejich výkonnostní zisky jsou vysoce závislé na dostupnosti lidských anotovaných analýz závislosti, což vyvolává důležité otázky týkající se životaschopnosti syntaxově rozšířených transformátorů v reálném světě.', 'ha': "Bayan aiki na ƙarshe yana son ka shigar da information na syntaɓa daga itãcen da ke inganci, za'a iya ƙara misãlai da za'a canza musanya wa-aikin da aka ƙayyade. Amma, aikin ka shigar da information a kan itãce ta dõgara zuwa misãlai na shige ta gabã ɗaya (misali, BERT) ba ta kasa ba, kuma haske da karatun nan a yanzu-yanzu ta gane yadda waɗannan misãlai ke kodi da kodi na bayani. A cikin wannan aikin, munã karatun amfani da ya shigar da itãcen dependanci zuwa shifottori masu shiryuwa ta gabã-wa-taƙaita a kan aikin masu shiryarwa matacce: aikin semantic role labelin (SRL), wanda aka ambaci sunan gaskiyar da gaskiyar, da cire-abun. Tuna buɗe da kewayi biyu masu buƙata dõmin a shigar da shi cikin tsarin da ke dõgara: wata hanyor fushi mai jinkiri, wanda ke amfani da zanen grafi na neural kan zartar da sha'anin wata shishi, da kuma wata hanyor fushi na haɗi, wanda ke tumɓutar da bakin sigar ta cikin zane-zane ta shige. These strategies are representative of prior work, but we introduce additional model design elements that are necessary for obtaining improved performance.  Anararin empirical na nuna cewa waɗannan transformers-da-da-aka-isticmbuwa za'a sami fassarar-na-da-art kan aikin SRL da masu husũma. Amma, Analyyinmu yana bayyana wani ƙaranci mai muhimmi daga waɗannan misãlai: Munã ganin cewa mafiya amfani da su ne mai ƙunci a kan misalin mazaɓan mutum-da-taƙaitaccen, wanda yana tãyar da su masu muhimu masu husũma a cikin shiryoyin ayuka da aka augutar da kodi-na-kodi.", 'he': 'Much recent work suggests that incorporating syntax information from dependency trees can improve task-specific transformer models.  עם זאת, ההשפעה של שיתוף מידע על עץ התלויות לדוגמאות משתנות מאומנות מראש (למשל BERT) נשארת לא ברורה, במיוחד בהתחשב במחקרים האחרונים שמדגישים איך הדוגמאות האלה קודמות סינטקס באופן מילוי. בעבודה הזו, אנו לומדים באופן שיטתי את השימוש של הכילוי עצי התלויות לתוך משתנים מאומנים מראש על שלושה משימות חיפוש מידע מייצגים: תיקון תפקיד סמנטי (SRL), זיהוי ישויות בשם, והחיפוש מערכות יחסים. אנו מציעים וחקירים שני אסטרטגיות ברורות לכילוי מבנה תלויות: גישה אחרונה למיזוג, אשר משתמשת ברשת עצבית גרף על יציאה של מעבר, וגישה משותפת למיזוג, אשר מעביר מבנה סינטקסי לתוך שכבות תשומת הלב של מעבר. אסטרטגיות אלה מייצגים עבודה קודמת, אך אנחנו מכירים אלמנטי עיצוב דוגמנים נוספים שהם הכרחיים כדי להשיג ביצועים משתפרים. הניתוח האימפרי שלנו מראה שהמשתנים האלה שמתוקפים בסינטקס מקבלים תוצאות מוקדמות על SRL ומשימות חיתוך יחסים. עם זאת, הניתוח שלנו חושף גם חסרות קריטית של הדוגמנים האלה: אנו מוצאים שהרווחות ביצועים שלהם תלויות באופן גבוה בהזמינות של מערכות תלויות שמכתבות על האדם', 'sk': 'Veliko novejših del kaže, da lahko vključitev sintaksnih informacij iz dreves odvisnosti izboljša modele transformatorjev, specifične za opravila. Vendar pa učinek vključevanja informacij o drevesu odvisnosti v vnaprej usposobljene modele transformatorjev (npr. BERT) ostaja nejasen, zlasti glede na nedavne študije, ki poudarjajo, kako ti modeli implicitno kodirajo sintakso. V tem delu sistematično preučujemo uporabnost vključevanja dreves odvisnosti v predhodno usposobljene transformatorje na treh reprezentativnih nalogah ekstrakcije informacij: semantično označevanje vlog (SRL), prepoznavanje entitet in ekstrakcijo relacij. Predlagamo in raziskujemo dve različni strategiji za vključevanje strukture odvisnosti: pristop pozne fuzije, ki uporablja grafsko nevronsko omrežje na izhodu transformatorja, in pristop skupne fuzije, ki vključuje sintaksno strukturo v plasti pozornosti transformatorja. Te strategije so reprezentativne za predhodno delo, vendar uvajamo dodatne elemente oblikovanja modela, ki so potrebni za doseganje boljše zmogljivosti. Naša empirična analiza kaže, da ti transformatorji s sintakso infundirani pridobijo najsodobnejše rezultate pri nalogah SRL in ekstrakcije relacij. Vendar pa naša analiza razkriva tudi kritično pomanjkljivost teh modelov: ugotavljamo, da je njihovo povečanje zmogljivosti močno odvisno od razpoložljivosti človeško označenih analiz odvisnosti, kar postavlja pomembna vprašanja glede preživetja transformatorjev, povečanih s sintakso, v realnih aplikacijah.', 'jv': 'Algorithm politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Nang dhéwé éntuk punika, kita sistematik dhéwé éntuk akeh njaluké karo perusahaan langkung sampeyan karo ingkang cara-cara sing gawe ngubah dhéwé: semanti rol label (SSL), nambah alam-alam sing berarti ngono kebebasan pangan. Awak dhéwé nggunakake karo istraksi sing dibutuhke sistem sing dibutuhke tarjamahan karo pakem nggawe barang nggawe geraksi kuwi wis mbukak banjur penting nggo transformer Astrawe iki dadi repréentasi uwong ing gawang sing sabanjuré, sane awak dhéwé ngetokake eleman sing dibenakno dumadhi sing bisa dianggap kanggo bisa bantuan njaluké nggawe bisa dianggap. Awakdhéwé empirhik éntuk mungkasi barang nggawe seneng barang kelas-kelas transformer iki bakal terus state-of-the-arts barang nggawe srL karo barang tanggal nggawe Awakdhéwé, akeh héwé éntuk akeh nggawe sistem sing gak bener: awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe jané perusahaan karo hal-hal nganggep sistem sing gak dhéwé karo hal-hal sing apik dhéwé, kuwi nggawe kesempalahan sing apik dhéwé kuwi:', 'bo': 'ཉེ་ཆར་བརྩོན་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་བཤད་པ་ནི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་གྱི་ཤིག་བྱང་ཆ་ཚོགས་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་དགོས་པ་ལས་བྱ་སྤྱོད་དམ However, the effect of incorporating dependency tree information into pre-trained transformer models (e.g. BERT) remains unclear, especially given recent studies highlighting how these models implicitly encode syntax. In this work, we systematically study the utility of incorporating dependency trees into pre-trained transformers on three representative information extraction tasks: semantic role labeling (SRL), named entity recognition, and relation extraction. We propose and investigate two distinct strategies for incorporating dependency structure: a late fusion approach, which applies a graph neural network on the output of a transformer, and a joint fusion approach, which infuses syntax structure into the transformer attention layers. གྲོང་སྒྲིག་འདི་དག་ནི་སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་རྟོགས་པ་གཙོ་བོ་ཡིན། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་མཐོང་སྔོན་གྱི་མ་དཔེ་གཞི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོའི་empirical analysis ན་གྱིས་syntax-infused transformers་འདི་ཚོ་རྣམས་གནས་སྟངས་ཕྱོགས་ཡོད་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་ཀྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡིན་ན། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱང་དེ་མིན་འཕགས་པའི་མ་མཐུན་པས་དཔེ་གཞི་འདི་དག་ལྟ་བུ་རྐྱེན་སྐབས་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Entity-level Factual Consistency of Abstractive Text Summarization', 'ar': 'الاتساق الواقعي على مستوى الكيان لتلخيص النص التجريدي', 'pt': 'Consistência factual em nível de entidade da sumarização de texto abstrato', 'fr': "Cohérence factuelle au niveau de l'entité de la synthèse de textes abstraits", 'es': 'Consistencia fáctica a nivel de entidad del resumen de texto abstractivo', 'ja': '抽象的なテキストの要約のエンティティレベルの事実の一貫性', 'zh': '抽象文本摘要实体一致性', 'hi': 'अमूर्त पाठ सारांशीकरण की एंटिटी-स्तर की तथ्यात्मक संगतता', 'ru': 'Фактологическая согласованность абстрактного резюме текста на уровне сущности', 'ga': 'Comhsheasmhacht Fíorasach ar leibhéal an Aonáin maidir le hAchoimriú Téacs Teibí', 'el': 'Πραγματική συνέπεια του αφηρημένου κειμένου σε επίπεδο οντότητας', 'ka': 'აბსტრაქტიური ტექსტის კომპანიზაციის ინტერტიკური დონე ფექტუალური კონსტენსტიური', 'kk': 'Абстрактивті мәтін тұжырымдамасының нысандары деңгейіндегі фактикалық сәйкестігі', 'lt': 'Subjekto lygio faktinis abstrakcinio teksto santraukos nuoseklumas', 'hu': 'Az absztrakt szöveg összefoglalásának entitásszintű tényszintű összhangja', 'mk': 'Фактична конзистентност на нивото на ентитетот на апстрактивното текст', 'ml': 'അബ്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്റ്റിവിന്റെ പദാവലി ചുരുക്കം', 'mn': 'Объектын түвшинд Абстрактив Текст Холбоо', 'ms': 'Kesesuaian Fakta Aras Entiti bagi Penapisan Teks Abstraktif', 'no': 'Entitetsnivå faktisk konsistens av abstraktiv tekstsamandrag', 'pl': 'Spójność faktyczna podsumowania tekstu abstrakcyjnego na poziomie podmiotu', 'sr': 'Razina entiteta faktualna konsistencija abstraktivnog teksta', 'it': 'Coerenza effettiva di sintesi del testo astratto a livello di entità', 'so': 'Heerka qoyska', 'sv': 'Fakta på enhetsnivå Sammanfattning av abstrakt text', 'ta': 'சுருக்கம்', 'mt': 'Konsistenza Fatwali fil-livell tal-entità tas-Sommarju tat-Test Abstrattiv', 'ro': 'Coerența faptuală la nivel de entitate a sintezeizării textului abstract', 'si': 'ඉන්තිත්වය- ස්තූතිය පාළුව සම්පූර්ණය', 'ur': 'انٹریٹی-سطح حقیقی تعلقات پاکستانی جمع کرنا', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Thực tế Có liên kết cấu hình', 'bg': 'Фактическа последователност на обобщението на абстрактния текст на ниво субект', 'da': 'Faktisk sammenhæng af abstrakt tekst på enhedsniveau', 'nl': 'Feitelijke consistentie van abstracte tekstsamenvatting op entiteitniveau', 'hr': 'Razina objekata činjenična konsistencija sažetka abstraktivnog teksta', 'de': 'Faktische Konsistenz der Zusammenfassung abstrakter Texte auf Entitätsebene', 'id': 'Konsistensi Fakta Tingkat Entitas dari Penapisan Teks Abstraktif', 'ko': '추상적 텍스트 요약의 실체적 사실 일치성', 'fa': 'اتفاقات حقیقی سطح واحدی از جمع\u200cآوری متن ناپذیر', 'sw': 'Uhitimu wa maandishi ya Ujumbe', 'af': 'Stencils', 'tr': 'Abstraktiw Metin Guruklamasynyň Gerçek derejesi', 'sq': 'Konsistencë faktore në nivelin e njësisë e përmbledhjes së tekstit abstraktiv', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Աբլաստրատիվ տեքստի համառոտագրության ֆակտական համապատասխանությունը միավորի մակարդակի վրա', 'az': 'Abstraktiv Metin Toplaşdırması', 'bn': 'আবট্রাক্টিভ টেক্সট সামারিজেশনের প্রতিষ্ঠান ফ্যাক্চুয়াল বৈশিষ্ট্য', 'bs': 'Razina objekata faktualna konsistencija abstraktivnog sažetka teksta', 'ca': 'Entity-level Factual Consistency of Abstractive Text Summarization', 'et': 'Üksuse tasandil kokkuvõtliku teksti faktiline kooskõla', 'cs': 'Faktická konzistence abstraktního textu na úrovni entity', 'fi': 'Yksikkötason yhteenvetojen tosiasiallinen johdonmukaisuus', 'he': 'תואם עובד ברמה של יחידות של סדרת טקסט אסטרקטיבית', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Dejstvena skladnost povzetka besedila na ravni subjekta', 'bo': 'Entity-level Factual Consistency of Abstractive Text Summarization', 'jv': 'Sambarang Teks Defterius'}
{'en': 'A key challenge for abstractive summarization is ensuring factual consistency of the generated summary with respect to the original document. For example, state-of-the-art models trained on existing datasets exhibit entity hallucination, generating names of entities that are not present in the source document. We propose a set of new metrics to quantify the entity-level factual consistency of generated summaries and we show that the entity hallucination problem can be alleviated by simply filtering the training data. In addition, we propose a summary-worthy entity classification task to the training process as well as a joint entity and summary generation approach, which yield further improvements in entity level metrics.', 'ar': 'يتمثل التحدي الرئيسي للتلخيص التجريدي في ضمان الاتساق الواقعي للملخص الناتج فيما يتعلق بالوثيقة الأصلية. على سبيل المثال ، تُظهر أحدث النماذج المدربة على مجموعات البيانات الحالية هلوسة الكيان ، مما يؤدي إلى إنشاء أسماء الكيانات غير الموجودة في المستند المصدر. نقترح مجموعة من المقاييس الجديدة لتحديد الاتساق الواقعي على مستوى الكيان للملخصات التي تم إنشاؤها ونبين أنه يمكن التخفيف من مشكلة الهلوسة في الكيان بمجرد تصفية بيانات التدريب. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نقترح مهمة تصنيف كيان جديرة بالملخص لعملية التدريب بالإضافة إلى كيان مشترك ونهج إنشاء الملخص ، مما يؤدي إلى مزيد من التحسينات في مقاييس مستوى الكيان.', 'pt': 'Um desafio fundamental para a sumarização abstrativa é garantir a consistência factual do resumo gerado em relação ao documento original. Por exemplo, modelos de última geração treinados em conjuntos de dados existentes exibem alucinações de entidades, gerando nomes de entidades que não estão presentes no documento de origem. Propomos um conjunto de novas métricas para quantificar a consistência factual em nível de entidade dos resumos gerados e mostramos que o problema de alucinação de entidade pode ser aliviado simplesmente filtrando os dados de treinamento. Além disso, propomos uma tarefa de classificação de entidade digna de resumo para o processo de treinamento, bem como uma entidade conjunta e uma abordagem de geração de resumo, que produz melhorias adicionais nas métricas de nível de entidade.', 'fr': "L'un des principaux défis de la synthèse abstraite est d'assurer la cohérence factuelle du résumé généré par rapport au document original. Par exemple, des modèles de pointe formés sur des ensembles de données existants présentent des hallucinations d'entités, générant des noms d'entités qui ne sont pas présentes dans le document source. Nous proposons un ensemble de nouvelles mesures pour quantifier la cohérence factuelle au niveau de l'entité des résumés générés et nous montrons que le problème d'hallucination des entités peut être atténué en filtrant simplement les données d'entraînement. En outre, nous proposons une tâche de classification des entités digne d'un résumé pour le processus de formation ainsi qu'une approche de génération conjointe d'entités et de résumés, qui permettent d'améliorer encore les métriques au niveau de l'entité.", 'es': 'Un desafío clave para el resumen abstractivo es garantizar la coherencia fáctica del resumen generado con respecto al documento original. Por ejemplo, los modelos de última generación entrenados en conjuntos de datos existentes muestran alucinaciones de entidades, lo que genera nombres de entidades que no están presentes en el documento fuente. Proponemos un conjunto de nuevas métricas para cuantificar la coherencia fáctica a nivel de entidad de los resúmenes generados y demostramos que el problema de alucinaciones de la entidad se puede aliviar simplemente filtrando los datos de capacitación. Además, proponemos una tarea de clasificación de entidades digna de resumen para el proceso de capacitación, así como un enfoque conjunto de entidades y generación de resúmenes, que producen mejoras adicionales en las métricas a nivel de entidad.', 'ja': '抽象的な要約の重要な課題は、元の文書に関して生成された要約の事実上の一貫性を確保することです。たとえば、既存のデータセットでトレーニングされた最先端のモデルは、エンティティの幻覚を示し、ソースドキュメントに存在しないエンティティの名前を生成します。生成された要約のエンティティレベルの事実の一貫性を定量化するための新しい指標のセットを提案し、トレーニングデータをフィルタリングするだけでエンティティの幻覚問題を軽減できることを示します。さらに、トレーニングプロセスに要約価値のあるエンティティ分類タスク、および共同エンティティと要約生成アプローチを提案し、エンティティレベルの指標のさらなる改善をもたらします。', 'hi': 'अमूर्त summarization के लिए एक महत्वपूर्ण चुनौती मूल दस्तावेज़ के संबंध में उत्पन्न सारांश की तथ्यात्मक स्थिरता सुनिश्चित करना है। उदाहरण के लिए, मौजूदा डेटासेट पर प्रशिक्षित अत्याधुनिक मॉडल एंटिटी मतिभ्रम प्रदर्शित करते हैं, जो स्रोत दस्तावेज़ में मौजूद नहीं होने वाली संस्थाओं के नाम उत्पन्न करते हैं। हम उत्पन्न सारांश की इकाई-स्तरीय तथ्यात्मक स्थिरता को मापने के लिए नए मैट्रिक्स के एक सेट का प्रस्ताव करते हैं और हम दिखाते हैं कि इकाई मतिभ्रम समस्या को केवल प्रशिक्षण डेटा को फ़िल्टर करके कम किया जा सकता है। इसके अलावा, हम प्रशिक्षण प्रक्रिया के साथ-साथ एक संयुक्त इकाई और सारांश पीढ़ी दृष्टिकोण के लिए एक सारांश-योग्य इकाई वर्गीकरण कार्य का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो इकाई स्तर मीट्रिक में और सुधार करता है।', 'zh': '抽象摘要之要,所以保生成也摘要与始文档之实一致性。 如今之数据集上训练之最先进者,形现实体幻觉,生成源文档中不存者名。 吾等建新指标以量化生成之摘要实一致性,且吾示以略而练数可以纾之。 又为培训举一实之分,与一合之质,摘要生成之法,更进实体级指标。', 'ru': 'Ключевой задачей для абстрактного резюме является обеспечение фактологической согласованности сгенерированного резюме по отношению к первоначальному документу. Например, современные модели, обученные работе с существующими наборами данных, демонстрируют галлюцинации сущностей, генерируя имена сущностей, которых нет в исходном документе. Мы предлагаем набор новых метрик для количественной оценки фактической согласованности сгенерированных сводок на уровне сущностей, и мы показываем, что проблему галлюцинаций сущностей можно облегчить, просто отфильтровав обучающие данные. Кроме того, мы предлагаем задачу классификации структуры, заслуживающую обобщения, для процесса обучения, а также совместный подход к организации и обобщению, которые приводят к дальнейшему улучшению показателей на уровне организации.', 'ga': 'Príomhdhúshlán maidir le hachoimriú teibí is ea comhsheasmhacht fhíorasach na hachoimre ginte maidir leis an gcáipéis bhunaidh a chinntiú. Mar shampla, taispeánann samhlacha úrscothacha atá oilte ar thacair sonraí atá ann cheana bréagchleachtadh aonáin, ag giniúint ainmneacha na n-eintiteas nach bhfuil i láthair sa bhundoiciméad. Molaimid tacar méadrachta nua chun comhsheasmhacht fíorasach na n-achoimrí ginte ar leibhéal an aonáin a chainníochtú agus léirímid gur féidir an fhadhb siabhránachta aonáin a mhaolú trí na sonraí oiliúna a scagadh. Ina theannta sin, molaimid tasc achomair chun aonán a rangú don phróiseas oiliúna chomh maith le cur chuige comhpháirteach aonáin agus giniúna achomair, as a dtiocfaidh tuilleadh feabhsuithe ar mhéadracht leibhéal an aonáin.', 'hu': 'Az absztraktív összefoglalás kulcsfontosságú kihívása az elkészített összefoglaló tényszerűségének biztosítása az eredeti dokumentumhoz képest. A meglévő adatkészletekre képzett legkorszerűbb modellek például entitás hallucinációt mutatnak, és olyan entitások nevét generálják, amelyek nem szerepelnek a forrásdokumentumban. Új mérőszámokat javasolunk a generált összefoglalók entitás-szintű tényszerű konzisztenciájának számszerűsítésére, és megmutatjuk, hogy az entitás hallucinációs problémája enyhíthető a képzési adatok egyszerű szűrésével. Ezen túlmenően javaslatot teszünk a képzési folyamathoz egy összefoglaló értékű entitás osztályozási feladatra, valamint egy közös entitás- és összefoglaló generálási megközelítésre, amely további fejlesztéseket eredményez az entitás szintjén.', 'ka': 'აბსტრაქტიური სიმბოლოებისთვის გასაკუთრებელი გამოცდილება იქნება, რომ შექმნილი სიმბოლოებისთვის ფაქტიური შემდგომარეობა. მაგალითად, ხელსაწყოთა მოდელები, რომლებიც აქვს მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში გამოყენებული ინტერტიკური ჰალუცინაციაში, შექმნა ინტერტიკური სახელები, რომლებიც არ არსებობს წ ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ ახალი მეტრიკის რაოდენობა, რომელიც განვითარებული საზოგადოებების ფექტური კონტაქტიური კონტაქტის კონტაქტის შესახებ და ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ინტერტიკის ჰალუცინაციის პრო დამატებით, ჩვენ გვეძლევა კლასიფიკაცია საზოგადოებო ელექტიკის კლასიფიკაცია პროცესზე, და ერთადერთი ელექტიკის და საზოგადოებო წარმოდგენის მიღება, რომელიც უფრო მეტრიკის განსა', 'el': 'Μια βασική πρόκληση για την αφηρημένη περίληψη είναι η εξασφάλιση της πραγματικής συνοχής της παραγόμενης περίληψης σε σχέση με το αρχικό έγγραφο. Για παράδειγμα, τα σύγχρονα μοντέλα που εκπαιδεύονται σε υπάρχοντα σύνολα δεδομένων παρουσιάζουν παραισθήσεις οντότητας, δημιουργώντας ονόματα οντοτήτων που δεν υπάρχουν στο έγγραφο προέλευσης. Προτείνουμε ένα σύνολο νέων μετρήσεων για να ποσοτικοποιήσουμε την πραγματική συνέπεια των παραγόμενων περιλήψεων σε επίπεδο οντότητας και δείχνουμε ότι το πρόβλημα της παραίσθησης της οντότητας μπορεί να ανακουφιστεί απλά φιλτράροντας τα δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης. Επιπλέον, προτείνουμε μια εργασία ταξινόμησης οντότητας άξια σύνοψης στη διαδικασία κατάρτισης καθώς και μια κοινή προσέγγιση δημιουργίας οντοτήτων και συνοπτικών στοιχείων, η οποία αποφέρει περαιτέρω βελτιώσεις στις μετρήσεις επιπέδου οντότητας.', 'kk': 'Абстрактивті тұжырымдамасының кілтті маңызды - бастапқы құжаттың қатынасына қарай құрылған тұжырымдамасының шындығын қамтамасыз етеді. Мысалы, бар деректер жиындарында оқылған суреттер үлгілері, көздегі құжатта жоқ нысандардың атауларын жасау үлгілері. Біз жаңа метрикалық жиындарды құрылған тұжырымдылығының фактикалық деңгейіндегі тұжырымдылығын есептеу үшін жаңа метрикалық жиындарды таңдап көрсетедік. Біз бұл жағдай халлюзиялық мәселе Қосымша, біз бағалау процесіне жалғастыру және жалғастыру тәртібі және жалғастыру тәртібін тапсырманы жасап береміз. Бұл жалғастыру мектрикалық деңгейіндегі жақсы жақсартуларды жаса', 'it': "Una sfida fondamentale per la sintesi astratta è garantire la coerenza fattuale della sintesi generata rispetto al documento originale. Ad esempio, modelli all'avanguardia formati su set di dati esistenti mostrano allucinazioni di entità, generando nomi di entità che non sono presenti nel documento sorgente. Proponiamo una serie di nuove metriche per quantificare la coerenza fattuale a livello di entità dei riassunti generati e mostriamo che il problema dell'allucinazione dell'entità può essere alleviato semplicemente filtrando i dati di allenamento. Inoltre, proponiamo al processo di formazione un'attività di classificazione delle entità degna di sintesi, nonché un approccio congiunto di generazione di entità e sintesi, che consente ulteriori miglioramenti nelle metriche a livello di entità.", 'lt': 'Pagrindinis abstrakčios santraukos uždavinys – užtikrinti faktinį sukauptos santraukos nuoseklumą, atsižvelgiant į original ų dokumentą. For example, state-of-the-art models trained on existing datasets exhibit entity hallucination, generating names of entities that are not present in the source document.  Siūlome naujų rodiklių rinkinį, kad būtų galima kiekybiškai įvertinti sukauptų santraukų faktinį nuoseklumą subjekto lygmeniu, ir parodome, kad subjekto haliucinacijų problem ą galima sušvelninti tiesiog filtruojant mokymo duomenis. Be to, siūlome apžvalgą vertą subjektų klasifikavimo užduotį mokymo procesui, taip pat bendrą subjektą ir bendrą gamybos metodą, dėl kurių bus toliau tobulinami subjektų lygio metriniai rodikliai.', 'ml': 'ആദ്യത്തെ രേഖയില്\u200d നിന്നും സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ സംസാരം ഉറപ്പുവരുത്തുന്നതിനായി അസ്ഥാപിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി നിലവിലുള്ള ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സ്റ്റേറ്റ്- കലാര്\u200dട്ട് മോഡലുകള്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ശു നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ മെട്രിക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു, ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വസ്തുക്കളുടെ ശരാര്യത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ സാ കൂടാതെ, ട്രെയിനിങ്ങളുടെ പ്രക്രിയയ്ക്കും ഒരു യൂട്ട് വസ്തുവിന്റെയും ഉച്ചതലമുറതലമുറയുടെയും അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിനും ഒരു ചുരുക്കമുള്ള ശാസ്', 'ms': 'Satu cabaran kunci untuk pengringkasan abstraktif adalah memastikan konsistensi fakta ringkasan yang dijana terhadap dokumen asal. Contohnya, model-state-of-the-art dilatih pada set data sedia ada menunjukkan halusinasi entiti, menghasilkan nama entiti yang tidak hadir dalam dokumen sumber. Kami cadangkan set metrik baru untuk kuantifikasikan konsistensi fakta aras entiti ringkasan yang dijana dan kami menunjukkan bahawa masalah halusinasi entiti boleh disembuhkan dengan hanya menapis data latihan. Selain itu, kami cadangkan tugas klasifikasi entiti yang layak ringkasan untuk proses latihan serta pendekatan entiti kongsi dan generasi ringkasan, yang memberikan peningkatan lanjut dalam metrik aras entiti.', 'no': 'Ein nøkkelutfordring for abstraktiv sammendrag er å sikra faktisk konsistens av den genererte sammendraga med respekt til den opprinnelige dokumentet. Eksempel på bruk av «state of the art» modeller som treng på eksisterande datasett viser halusinasjon av entitet, og lagar namn på einingar som ikkje finst i kjeldedokumentet. Vi foreslår eit sett av nye metrikar for å kvantifika faktiske konsistens av genererte samandrag og vi viser at problem med halusinasjon av einingar kan alleviarast ved å filterera opplæringsdata. I tillegg foreslår vi eit sammendragsverdig entitetsklassifikasjonsverdig oppgåve til opplæringsprosessen, og ein tilnærming til samandrag og samandrag, som gjer meir forbedringar i metrikar for entitetsnivå.', 'mn': 'Экстрактив тодорхойлолтын чухал сорилт нь эхний баримтын тухай үүсгэгдсэн жинхэнэ тодорхойлолтын үндсэн байдал юм. Жишээлбэл, сургалтын өгөгдлийн сангуудын төлөө сургалтын урлагийн загварын загвар нь бий болгон бий болгож байгаагүй бүтээлүүдийн нэр үүсгэдэг. Бид бүтээгдэхүүний жинхэнэ жинхэнэ хэмжээсүүдийг тооцоолох шинэ хэмжээсүүдийг санал дэвшүүлнэ. Бид бүтээгдэхүүний шийдвэрлэлтийн асуудлыг зөвхөн сургалтын өгөгдлийг цэвэрлэхээр багасгаж болно Мөн бид дасгал хөгжлийн процесс болон нийлбэр бүтэц болон жинхэнэ үеийн арга замыг илүү сайжруулж чадна.', 'mt': "Sfida ewlenija għas-sommarju astrattiv hija l-iżgurar tal-konsistenza fattwali tas-sommarju ġġenerat fir-rigward tad-dokument oriġinali. For example, state-of-the-art models trained on existing datasets exhibit entity hallucination, generating names of entities that are not present in the source document.  Aħna qed nipproponu sett ta’ metriċi ġodda biex nikkwantifikaw il-konsistenza fattwali fil-livell tal-entità tas-sommarji ġġenerati u nagħmlu evidenza li l-problem a tal-alluċinazzjoni tal-entità tista’ titnaqqas billi sempliċement tiġi ffiltrata d-dejta tat-taħriġ. Barra minn hekk, qed nipproponu kompitu ta' klassifikazzjoni tal-entità li jaqbel is-sommarju għall-proċess ta' taħriġ kif ukoll approċċ konġunt ta' entità u ġenerazzjoni sommarja, li jwassal għal aktar titjib fil-metriċi fil-livell tal-entità.", 'pl': 'Kluczowym wyzwaniem dla streszczenia abstrakcyjnego jest zapewnienie faktycznej spójności generowanego streszczenia z oryginalnym dokumentem. Na przykład najnowocześniejsze modele przeszkolone na istniejących zbiorach danych wykazują halucynacje jednostek, generując nazwy podmiotów, które nie są obecne w dokumencie źródłowym. Proponujemy zestaw nowych wskaźników do ilościowego określenia spójności faktycznej generowanych podsumowań na poziomie jednostki i pokazujemy, że problem halucynacji jednostki można złagodzić poprzez po prostu filtrowanie danych treningowych. Ponadto proponujemy do procesu szkoleniowego zadanie klasyfikacji podmiotów godne podsumowania oraz wspólne podejście do generowania podmiotów i podsumowań, które przynosi dalsze ulepszenia wskaźników poziomu jednostki.', 'ro': 'O provocare cheie pentru rezumarea abstractivă constă în asigurarea coerenței factuale a rezumatului generat în raport cu documentul original. De exemplu, modelele de ultimă oră instruite pe seturi de date existente prezintă halucinații de entitate, generând nume de entități care nu sunt prezente în documentul sursă. Propunem un set de noi metrici pentru a cuantifica consecventa factuala la nivel de entitate a rezumatelor generate si aratam ca problema halucinatiei entitatii poate fi atenuata prin simpla filtrare a datelor de antrenament. În plus, propunem procesului de formare o sarcină de clasificare a entităților demnă de rezumat, precum și o abordare comună de generare a entităților și a rezumatului, care generează îmbunătățiri suplimentare în măsurătorile la nivel de entitate.', 'mk': 'Клучен предизвик за апстрактивна резултатација е осигурувањето на фактичната конзистенција на генерираниот резултат во однос на оригиналниот документ. На пример, најновите модели обучени на постоечките податоци изложуваат халуцинации на ентитетите, генерирајќи имиња на ентитети кои не се присутни во изворниот документ. Предложуваме нови метрики за квантификување на фактичната конзистенција на ниво на ентитетот на генерираните резултати и покажуваме дека проблемот со халуцинациите на ентитетот може да се олесни со едноставно филтрирање на податоците за обука. In addition, we propose a summary-worthy entity classification task to the training process as well as a joint entity and summary generation approach, which yield further improvements in entity level metrics.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක සංවේදනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක සංවේදනය සඳ උදාහරණයෙන්, තියෙන්න තියෙන්න තොරතුරු සෙට්ටුවට ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ state-of-the-art මොඩේල්ස්, ප්\u200dරධානයක් ප්\u200dරධානය ක අපි අළුත් මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් සම්පූර්ණයක් ප්\u200dරසිද්ධා කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්න ඒ වගේම, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ', 'sv': 'En viktig utmaning för abstraktiv sammanfattning är att se till att den genererade sammanfattningen överensstämmer med originaldokumentet. Exempelvis uppvisar toppmoderna modeller utbildade på befintliga datauppsättningar entitetshallucinationer, vilket genererar namn på entiteter som inte finns i källdokumentet. Vi föreslår en uppsättning nya mätvärden för att kvantifiera den faktiska konsekvensen på entitetsnivå av genererade sammanfattningar och vi visar att entitetshallucinationsproblemet kan lindras genom att helt enkelt filtrera träningsdata. Dessutom föreslår vi en sammanfattningsvärd enhetsklassificeringsuppgift för utbildningsprocessen samt en gemensam enhets- och sammanfattningsstrategi, vilket ger ytterligare förbättringar av mätvärden på entitetsnivå.', 'ta': 'Name உதாரணமாக, தற்போதைய தகவல் அமைப்புகளில் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளின் நிலைமை- கலை மாதிரிகள் பொருள் பரிசுத்தம், மூல ஆவணத்தில் இல்ல நாம் ஒரு புதிய மெட்ரிக்களை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட சுருக்குகளின் உண்மையான சொல்லாக்கத்தை சரிபார்க்க மற்றும் நாம் காட்டுகிறோம அதற்கும், நாம் பயிற்சி செயலுக்கு சுருக்கமான பொருள் வகுப்பு பணியை மற்றும் ஒரு இணைய பொருள் மற்றும் சுருக்கமான தலைமுறையை பரிந்துரைக்கி', 'ur': 'آب تراکٹیوں کے ذکر کے لئے ایک کلی چال ہے کہ اصلی دکھانے کے معاملہ میں پیدا کیا گیا سامنے کی حقیقی تعمیری سفارش کرتا ہے. مثال، موجود ڈاٹ سٹ پر آموزش کی موجود آرتی موڈل کے ذریعے ایک ٹیٹی ہلوسیناٹ کی تعلیم کرتی ہے، جن کے نام سراسر دکھانے میں موجود نہیں ہیں۔ ہم نے ایک مجموعہ نو میٹریک کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ انٹیٹی-سطح کی حقیقی تعبیر کی تعبیر کریں اور ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ انٹیٹی ہلوسینٹی مسئلہ صرف تدریس ڈیٹی کو فیلتر کریں۔ اور اس کے علاوہ ہم نے ترینس پرسس کے لئے ایک سراسر ارزش دار entity classification task کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے اور ایک جوڑی entity اور سراسر نسل کے طریقے کی، جس نے entity level metrics میں اضافہ کی improvements پیدا کیا ہے.', 'sr': 'Ključni izazov za abstraktivnu sažetku osigurava činjeničnu konsekvenciju proizvedenog sažetka u pogledu originalnog dokumenta. Na primjer, modeli stanja umjetnosti obučeni na postojećim podacima pokazuju halucinaciju entiteta, stvarajući imena entitata koje nisu prisutne u izvornom dokumentu. Predlažemo gomilu novih metrika da kvantificiramo činjeničnu konsekvenciju stvarnih sažetaka na nivou entiteta i pokažemo da problem halucinacije entiteta može biti ublažen jednostavno filtriranjem podataka o obuci. Osim toga, predlažemo zadatak klasifikacije sažetaka vrijednih entiteta procesu obuke, kao i zajednički pristup generacije entiteta i sažetaka, koji dodaje daljnje poboljšanje metrika nivoa entiteta.', 'so': 'Caqabadaha muhiimka ah ee la xiriira jimicsiga ah waa in la xaqiijiyo isku-xidhiidhka warqada asalka ah. Tusaale ahaan noocyada farshaxanka ah oo lagu tababariyey qoraalka taariikhda waxaad ka heleysaa isdaahirin entities, wuxuuna dhalayaa magacyo entities aan ku jirin dukumentiga asalka. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaablo cusub si aan u qiimeyno dhamaanka runta ah ee dhamaanka dhamaanka ee soo baxay, waxaana tusnaynaa in dhibaatada hallaynta jidhku looga fududeeyo si fudud looga baaraandegayo macluumaadka waxbarashada. Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaynu u soo jeedaynaa shaqo fasax u istaahila dhameystirka waxbarashada iyo qaabilaada wadajirka ah iyo qaabilaada farshaxanka xagaalka ah, kaas oo ka soo bixinaya kororsiinta heerka shaqada.', 'uz': "Name Masalan, mavjud maʼlumot sahifadagi sanalar holati taʼminlovchisi maʼlumot bazasining taʼminlovchisini koʻrsatish. Manba hujjatda mavjud emas maʼlumot nomini yaratish. Biz taʼminlovchi maʼlumotni aniqlash uchun yangi metriklarni tasdiqlash uchun boshqa tugmalar tartib qilamiz va biz taʼminlovchi maʼlumotni soʻzlashtirish mumkin. Ko'pchilik, biz ta'lim jarayonini va birlashtirish tizimi va kichkinagi avtomatik taʼminlovchiga qisqarli ma'lumotning vazifasini talab qilamiz, bu tizim darajadagi bir qanday o'zgarishni bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Một thách thức quan trọng cho việc tổng quát kinh doanh là đảm bảo sự tương đồng thực tế của bản tóm tắt về tài liệu gốc. Ví dụ, các mô hình hiện đại được đào tạo trên các tập tin tồn tại có đầy ảo giác, tạo ra tên của các thực thể không có trong tài liệu nguồn. Chúng tôi đề xuất một loạt các âm lượng mới để xác định mức độ tương đồng thực tế của các bản kê đã tạo ra và chúng tôi cho thấy vấn đề ảo giác thực thể có thể giảm bớt bằng việc lọc các dữ liệu huấn luyện. Ngoài ra, chúng tôi đề xuất một nhiệm vụ phân tích tập thể hấp dẫn cho quá trình đào tạo, cũng như một tổ chức chung và một phương pháp sản xuất tóm tắt, mà cung cấp thiết lập đo trình đo cung cấp thực thể cải tiến thêm.', 'bg': 'Основно предизвикателство за абстрактното обобщаване е гарантирането на фактическа последователност на генерираното обобщение по отношение на оригиналния документ. Например, най-съвременните модели, обучени върху съществуващи набори от данни, показват халюцинации на субекти, генериращи имена на субекти, които не присъстват в изходния документ. Предлагаме набор от нови показатели за количествено определяне на фактическата последователност на генерираните резюмета на ниво субект и показваме, че проблемът с халюцинациите на субекта може да бъде облекчен чрез просто филтриране на данните за обучение. В допълнение, предлагаме обобщена задача за класификация на субектите към процеса на обучение, както и подход за съвместно генериране на субекти и обобщено генериране, които дават допълнителни подобрения в показателите на ниво субекти.', 'nl': 'Een belangrijke uitdaging voor abstracte samenvatting is het waarborgen van feitelijke consistentie van de gegenereerde samenvatting ten opzichte van het oorspronkelijke document. Zo vertonen state-of-the-art modellen getraind op bestaande datasets entiteitshallucinaties, waardoor namen worden gegenereerd van entiteiten die niet in het brondocument aanwezig zijn. We stellen een reeks nieuwe metrics voor om de feitelijke consistentie van gegenereerde samenvattingen op entiteitniveau te kwantificeren en we laten zien dat het hallucinatieprobleem van entiteiten kan worden verlicht door simpelweg de trainingsgegevens te filteren. Daarnaast stellen we een samenvattingswaardige entiteitsclassificatietaak voor voor het trainingsproces, evenals een gezamenlijke entiteits- en samenvattingsgeneratie aanpak voor, die verdere verbeteringen in entiteitsniveau statistieken oplevert.', 'da': 'En vigtig udfordring for abstraktiv sammenfatning er at sikre faktisk konsistens i det genererede sammenfatning i forhold til det oprindelige dokument. For eksempel udviser state-of-the-art modeller, der er trænet i eksisterende datasæt, entity hallucination, der genererer navne på entiteter, der ikke er til stede i kildedokumentet. Vi foreslår et sæt nye målinger til at kvantificere den faktuelle konsistens på entitetsniveau af genererede resuméer, og vi viser, at entitetshallucinationsproblemet kan afhjælpes ved blot at filtrere træningsdata. Derudover foreslår vi en sammenfattende enhedsklassificeringsopgave til træningsprocessen samt en fælles enheds- og sammenfattende genereringstilgang, som giver yderligere forbedringer i enhedsniveau metrics.', 'hr': 'Ključni izazov za abstraktivnu sažetku osigurava činjeničnu konsekvenciju proizvedenog sažetka u pogledu originalnog dokumenta. Na primjer, modeli stanja umjetnosti obučeni na postojećim podacima pokazuju halucinaciju entiteta, stvarajući imena entitata koje nisu prisutne u izvornom dokumentu. Predlažemo gomilu novih metrika za kvantificiranje činjenične konsekvencije izrađenih sažetaka na nivou entiteta i pokažemo da problem halucinacije entiteta može biti ublažen jednostavno filtriranjem podataka o obuci. Osim toga, predlažemo zadatak klasifikacije subjekta vrijednog sažetka procesu obuke, kao i zajednički pristup generacije subjekta i sažetka, koji dodaje daljnje poboljšanje metrika razine subjekta.', 'de': 'Eine wesentliche Herausforderung für die abstraktive Zusammenfassung ist die Sicherstellung der faktischen Konsistenz der generierten Zusammenfassung in Bezug auf das Originaldokument. Beispielsweise zeigen moderne Modelle, die auf vorhandenen Datensätzen trainiert werden, Entitätshalluzinationen und erzeugen Namen von Entitäten, die nicht im Quelldokument vorhanden sind. Wir schlagen eine Reihe neuer Metriken vor, um die faktische Konsistenz generierter Zusammenfassungen auf Entitätsebene zu quantifizieren und zeigen, dass das Halluzinationsproblem durch einfaches Filtern der Trainingsdaten gemildert werden kann. Darüber hinaus schlagen wir eine zusammenfassungswürdige Entity-Klassifikationsaufgabe für den Trainingsprozess sowie einen gemeinsamen Entity- und Summary-Generierungsansatz vor, der weitere Verbesserungen der Entity-Level-Metriken ermöglicht.', 'id': 'Sebuah tantangan kunci untuk penerangan abstraktif adalah memastikan konsistensi faktual dari penerangan yang dibuat terhadap dokumen asli. Contohnya, model terbaik yang dilatih pada set data yang ada menunjukkan halusinasi entitas, menghasilkan nama entitas yang tidak hadir dalam dokumen sumber. We propose a set of new metrics to quantify the entity-level factual consistency of generated summaries and we show that the entity hallucination problem can be alleviated by simply filtering the training data.  Selain itu, kami mengusulkan tugas klasifikasi entitas yang layak untuk proses pelatihan serta sebuah entitas kongsi dan pendekatan generasi ringkasan, yang memberikan perkembangan lanjut dalam metrik tingkat entitas.', 'fa': 'یک چالش کلیدی برای جمع\u200cآوری abstractive در مورد جمع\u200cآوری اصلی در مورد سند اصلی است. برای مثال، مدل\u200cهای وضعیت هنری که روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها موجود آموزش داده شده\u200cاند، تعلیم داده شده\u200cاند، تهیه\u200cکننده\u200cی عنوان\u200cهایی که در سند منبع وجود ندارند، نام\u200cهایی را تولید می\u200cکنند. ما یک مجموعه متریک جدید را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا تعداد واقعی سطح entity-level واقعی از جمع\u200cآوری\u200cهای تولید کند و نشان می\u200cدهیم که مشکل حل\u200cسازی entity می\u200cتواند با ساده فیلتر داده\u200cهای آموزش کمتر شود. در addition, we propose a summary entity classification task to the training process as well as a joint entity and summary generation approach, which gives further improvements in entity level metrics.', 'ko': '요약의 관건적인 도전은 생성된 요약이 원본 문서와 사실상 일치성을 확보하는 것이다.예를 들어 기존 데이터 집합에서 훈련된 가장 선진적인 모델은 실체 환각을 나타내고 원본 문서에 존재하지 않는 실체 이름을 생성한다.우리는 새로운 지표를 제시하여 요약을 생성하는 실체급 사실의 일치성을 계량화했다. 우리는 훈련 데이터를 간단하게 필터링함으로써 실체 환각 문제가 완화될 수 있음을 나타냈다.그 밖에 우리는 교육 과정에 총괄할 만한 실체 분류 임무와 실체와 요약 생성 방법을 연합하여 실체 단계의 도량을 더욱 개선했다.', 'sw': 'Changamoto muhimu la kuhakikisha ukweli ukweli wa muhtasari uliotengenezwa kwa kuheshimu nyaraka za asili. Kwa mfano, mifano ya sanaa inayofundishwa katika seti za taarifa zinazopo inaonyesha usafi wa entity, kutengeneza majina ya vitu ambavyo havijo katika nyaraka za chanzo. Tunazipendekeza mbinu mpya kuhakikisha ukweli wa kiwango cha kiwango kinachotengenezwa na tunaonyesha kuwa tatizo la usafi wa entity unaweza kupunguza kwa kuchuja taarifa za mafunzo tu. Zaidi ya hayo, tunapendekeza jukumu la usambazaji wa entity yenye thamani ya muhtasari kwa mchakato wa mafunzo pamoja na kituo cha pamoja na mbinu za kizazi cha muhimu, ambacho kinaleta maendeleo zaidi katika kiwango cha viwanda.', 'tr': 'Abstraktiw toplanty üçin wajyp kynçylyk görkezilişi tespit edip görkezilýän holasasy üçin özüniň senediň ýagdaýynyň bir durlygy saýlamak. mysal,meýdança veri setirlerinde okuwçylýan durum-sanat modelleri birnäçe halucinasiýa çykýar, çeşme senede bolmadyk birnäçe adlary bejerýär. Biz birnäçe metrik düzedilerini üretilen toparlaryň bir näçe derejesi bejermek üçin teklip edip, birnäçe hedef halucinasiýasynyň soragyny diňe bir şekilde filtrelemek üçin azaltabiler. Munuň üçin, biziň özümizde hulat taýýarlanmagyna meýilleşdirilmäge maksady taýýarlanmagyň zadyny okuw prosesyna we jemgyýet taýýarlanmagyny we jemgyýet döretmegi teklip edýäris.', 'sq': 'Një sfidë kryesore për përmbledhjen abstraktive është sigurimi i konsistencës faktike të përmbledhjes së gjeneruar lidhur me dokumentin origjinal. Për shembull, modelet më të moderne të trajnuara në grupet ekzistuese të të dhënave ekspozojnë hallucinacione të njësisë, duke krijuar emra të njësive që nuk janë të pranishme në dokumentin e burimit. Ne propozojmë një sërë metrike të reja për të kuantifikuar konsistencën faktore në nivelin e njësisë të përmbledhjeve të gjeneruara dhe ne tregojmë se problemi i hallucinacionit të njësisë mund të lehtësohet duke thjesht filtruar të dhënat e trajnimit. Përveç kësaj, ne propozojmë një detyrë klasifikimi të njësisë së vlefshme për përmbledhje për procesin e trainimit si dhe një njësi të përbashkët dhe një qasje të përgjithshme gjenerative, e cila sjell përmirësime të mëtejshme në metrikat e nivelit të njësisë.', 'af': "'n Sleutel uitdrukking vir abstraktiewe opsomming is seker faktuele konsistensie van die genereerde opsomming met respek na die oorspronklike dokument. Byvoorbeeld, state-of-the-art modele wat op bestaande datastelle onderwerp word, uitstel entiteitheilulusinasie, genereer naams van entiteite wat nie in die bron dokument voorsien is nie. Ons voorstel 'n stel nuwe metries om die entiteitvlak faktuele konsistensie van genereerde opsommings te quantifiseer en ons wys dat die entiteitheilulusinasie probleem kan alleviaat word deur eenvoudig die opsomming data filtering te word. In addition, we propose a summary-worthy entity classification task to the training process as well as a joint entity and summary generation approach, which yield further improvements in entity level metrics.", 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር ለምሳሌ፣ የአሁኑን ዳታ ሰርቨሮች ላይ የተማሩ የሥርዓት ዓይነቶች አካባቢውን ቅድስናዊ ማሳየት፣ በምዕራብ ሰነድ ውስጥ ያልተገኘውን የአካላት ስም ማድረግ ማድረግ ነው፡፡ አዲስ ማተሚያዎች አካባቢ-ደረጃ ውጤቱን ማሰናከል እናሳውቃለን፡፡ አካባቢው ቅድስናዊ መከራ ከቴናዎችን በመጠቀም በቀላል ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ለትምህርት ፕሮጀክት እና የተጠቃሚ አካል እና የአጠቃሚ ትውልድ ሥርዓት ማቀናቀል እና የአካባቢ ደረጃ ማተዳረጊዎችን የሚያሳውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Աբստրակտիվ համառոտագրության հիմնական մարտահրավերն այն է, որ ապահովում է ստեղծված համառոտագրության փաստացիոն համապատասխանությունը սկզբնական փաստաթղթի հետ կապված: For example, state-of-the-art models trained on existing datasets exhibit entity hallucination, generating names of entities that are not present in the source document.  Մենք առաջարկում ենք մի շարք նոր մետրիկներ, որպեսզի չափեցնենք կազմակերպության մակարդակի փաստական կայունությունը ստեղծված համառոտագրություններում և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ կազմակերպության հալյուցինացիաների խնդիրը կարող է լուծվել պարզապես ֆիլտրելով ուսուցման տվ Ավելին, մենք առաջարկում ենք համառոտագրական առանձնահատկությունների դասակարգման խնդիր ուսումնասիրության գործընթացի համար, ինչպես նաև միավոր առանձնահատկություն և համառոտագրական սերունդ մոտեցում, որոնք առաջացնում են առանձին բարելավումներ առան', 'bn': 'সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপের জন্য একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ চ্যালেঞ্জ হচ্ছে প্রথম নথির সম্পর্কে তৈরি করা সত্যিকারের সার্বতন্ত্ উদাহরণস্বরূপ, বিদ্যমান ডাটাসেটের প্রদর্শনীতে শিল্পিত রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে, যা উৎস নথিতে উপস্থি আমরা একটি নতুন মেট্রিক প্রস্তাব করছি যাতে সংক্ষেপ তৈরি করা হয়েছে যে বস্তুর স্তরের বাস্তবতা পরিমাণ পরিমাপ করা যায় এবং আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য পরিশ এছাড়াও, আমরা প্রশিক্ষণ প্রক্রিয়ার জন্য সার্মিক-যোগ্য বস্তুর ক্লাস্ফিকেশন কাজের প্রস্তাব করি এবং যৌথ বস্তু এবং সামার্ক প্রজন্মের ক্ষেত', 'az': 'Abstraktiv təmizlənmək üçün anahtar çətinlikdir. Özgür dökümə haqqında təmizlənmiş təmizlənmənin əsas təmizlənməsini təmin edir. Misal olaraq, mevcut verilən qurğular üzərində təhsil edilən məlumat modellərinin halucinasyonu göstərir, mənbə dökümündə olmayan entitlərin adlarını yaradır. Biz yeni metrikləri təklif edirik ki, təhsil məlumatlarının əsas təhsil edilməsini kvantitat etmək üçün, təhsil məlumatlarını filtr etmək üçün təhsil edirik. Əvvəlcə, biz təhsil prosesinə həmçin in həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçi', 'ca': "Un repte clau per a la resumensió abstracta és assegurar la consistencia factual del resum generat en relació al document original. Per exemple, els models més moderns entrenats en conjunts de dades existents mostran alucinacions d'entitats, generant noms d'entitats que no estan presents en el document de font. Proposem un conjunt de noves mètriques per quantificar la consistencia factual a nivell de l'entitat dels resums generats i demostram que el problema de la alucinació de l'entitat pot ser aliviat simplement filtrant les dades d'entrenament. A més, proposem una tasca de classificació d'entitats digna de resum al procés de formació, així com un enfocament conjunt d'entitats i generació de resum, que produeixen millors adicionals en les mètriques a nivell d'entitats.", 'bs': 'Ključni izazov za abstraktivnu sažetku osigurava činjeničnu konsekvenciju proizvedenog sažetka u pogledu originalnog dokumenta. Na primjer, modeli države umjetnosti obučeni na postojećim podacima pokazuju halucinaciju entiteta, stvarajući imena entitata koje nisu prisutne u izvornom dokumentu. Predlažemo gomilu novih metrika da kvantificiramo činjeničnu konsekvenciju stvarnih sažetaka na nivou entiteta i pokažemo da problem halucinacije entiteta može ublažiti jednostavno filtriranjem podataka o obuci. Osim toga, predlažemo zadatak klasifikacije subjekta vrijednog sažetka procesu obuke, kao i zajednički pristup generacije subjekta i sažetka, koji dodaje daljnje poboljšanje metrika nivoa subjekta.', 'cs': 'Klíčovou výzvou pro abstraktivní shrnutí je zajištění faktické konzistence generovaného shrnutí s ohledem na původní dokument. Například nejmodernější modely trénované na existujících datových sadách vykazují halucinaci entit, které generují názvy entit, které nejsou přítomny ve zdrojovém dokumentu. Navrhujeme sadu nových metrik pro kvantifikaci faktické konzistence generovaných souhrnů na úrovni entity a ukazujeme, že problém halucinace entity lze zmírnit jednoduchým filtrováním tréninkových dat. Navíc navrhujeme souhrnný úkol klasifikace entit hodný pro proces školení, stejně jako společný přístup k generování entit a souhrnného přístupu, který přináší další zlepšení metrik na úrovni entity.', 'et': 'Abstraktse kokkuvõtte peamine väljakutse on koostatud kokkuvõtte faktilise kooskõla tagamine originaaldokumendiga. Näiteks olemasolevate andmekogumite põhjal koolitatud kaasaegsetel mudelitel esineb üksuste hallutsinatsioone, tekitades nende üksuste nimesid, mida lähtedokumendis ei ole. Pakume välja uusi mõõdikuid, et kvantifitseerida koostatud kokkuvõtete faktilist järjepidevust üksuse tasandil, ning näitame, et üksuse hallutsinatsiooni probleemi saab leevendada lihtsalt koolitusandmete filtreerimisega. Lisaks pakume välja koolitusprotsessile kokkuvõtliku üksuse klassifitseerimise ülesande ning ühise üksuse ja kokkuvõtliku koostamise lähenemisviisi, mis annab täiendavaid täiustusi üksuse taseme mõõdikutes.', 'fi': 'Abstraktisen yhteenvedon keskeinen haaste on luoda tiivistelmä alkuperäiseen asiakirjaan nähden. Esimerkiksi olemassa oleviin tietoaineistoihin koulutetuissa nykyaikaisissa malleissa esiintyy entiteettihallusinaatioita, jotka tuottavat niiden entiteettien nimiä, joita ei ole lähdeasiakirjassa. Ehdotamme uusia mittareita, joiden avulla voidaan kvantifioida tuotetun yhteenvedon kokonaisuustason faktatietojen johdonmukaisuutta, ja osoitamme, että kokonaisuuden hallusinaatioongelmaa voidaan lievittää yksinkertaisesti suodattamalla koulutustiedot. Lisäksi ehdotamme koulutusprosessiin yhteenvedonarvoista kokonaisuusluokittelutehtävää sekä yhteistä kokonaisuus- ja yhteenvedonluontia, jotka tuovat lisää parannuksia yhteisötason mittareihin.', 'jv': 'Aspect ratio sample Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem sing dibutuhke sistem sing gawe nggawe barang kelas yen manut karo ingkang dipunangé kamanggawe lan ijol-ijolan winih dhéwé Genjer', 'he': 'אתגר מפתח לסיוריזציה אסטרקטיבית הוא להבטיח התקבלות עובדית של הסיוריזציה המיוצרת בנוגע למסמך המקורי. לדוגמא, מודלים חדשים מאומנים על קבוצות נתונים קיימות מראים זיות של יחידות, יוצרים שמות של יחידות שלא נוכחות במסמך המקור. אנו מציעים קבוצה של מטריות חדשות כדי להכין את התקבלות העובדית ברמת היחידות של סדרות יוצרות ואנחנו מראים שבעיית ההזיות של היחידות יכולה להיקל על ידי פשוט לסנן את נתוני האימון. בנוסף, אנו מציעים משימה סיווג יחידות ראויה לסכם לתהליך האימונים, כמו גם יחידה משותפת וגישה של דור סאמרי, שמביאה שיפורים נוספים במטריקות רמת יחידות.', 'sk': 'Ključni izziv za abstraktivno povzetek je zagotavljanje dejanske skladnosti ustvarjenega povzetka glede na izvirni dokument. Na primer, najsodobnejši modeli, usposobljeni na podlagi obstoječih naborov podatkov, kažejo halucinacije entitet, ki ustvarjajo imena entitet, ki niso prisotne v izvornem dokumentu. Predlagamo nabor novih meritev za kvantifikacijo dejanske doslednosti ustvarjenih povzetkov na ravni subjekta in pokažemo, da je problem halucinacij subjekta mogoče olajšati s preprosto filtriranjem podatkov o usposabljanju. Poleg tega v procesu usposabljanja predlagamo povzetek vredno klasifikacijsko nalogo subjekta ter skupni pristop za generiranje povzetkov, ki prinaša nadaljnje izboljšave meritev na ravni subjekta.', 'ha': "@ action: button Misali, misali, misalin-halin-sanar da aka sanar da shi a kan tsari masu jira, yana nuna halin sunayen abun da ba su halarce ba cikin takardar source. Kana goyyar da wasu metrici na daban dõmin ka ƙayyade matsayin-daraja na da gaskiyar da aka ƙãga ƙararin da aka ƙãga, kuma muna nuna cewa an sauƙa ƙara masĩfar sunalin abun da za'a iya amfani da fililin data na tsari kawai. Da wannan, Munã goyyar da wani aikin mai classified masu inganci wa muhimmi zuwa ma'anar aikin mafarin da sami da wata matsayi na wadangan da mazaɓa da muhimmi, wanda ke ƙara ƙaranci cikin metrici na ƙanshi.", 'bo': 'གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་བཅུད་སྡུད་ལ་གལ་ཆེན་ལ་ངོས་འཛིན་ཡོད་པ་དེ་ནི་ཐོག་མའི་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འབྲི་ཡོད་པའི་བཅུད་ས དཔེར་ན། གནས་སྟངས་གནས་སྟངས་དང་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་སྟོན་ཡོད་པའི་ཚོགས་ཤིག་ཡིག་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་མི་འདུག We propose a set of new metrics to quantify the entity-level factual consistency of generated summaries and we show that the entity hallucination problem can be alleviated by simply filtering the training data. In addition, we propose a summary-worthy entity classification task to the training process as well as a joint entity and summary generation approach, which yield further improvements in entity level metrics.'}
{'en': 'Diverse Adversaries for Mitigating Bias in Training', 'ar': 'أعداء متنوعون للتخفيف من التحيز في التدريب', 'pt': 'Diversos adversários para mitigar o viés no treinamento', 'fr': "Des adversaires diversifiés pour atténuer les préjugés lors de l'entraînement", 'es': 'Diversos adversarios para mitigar el sesgo en el entrenamiento', 'ja': 'トレーニングにおける偏見を軽減するための多様な敵', 'zh': '轻练偏多样化敌', 'hi': 'प्रशिक्षण में पूर्वाग्रह को कम करने के लिए विविध विरोधियों', 'ru': 'Различные противники смягчения предвзятости в обучении', 'ga': 'Sáraimh Éagsúla do Laofacht a Mhaolú san Oiliúint', 'el': 'Διάφοροι αντίπαλοι για την άμβλυνση των προκαταλήψεων στην εκπαίδευση', 'hu': 'Különböző ellentétek a képzésben az elkötelezettségek enyhítésére', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Differenti avversi per mitigare i bias nella formazione', 'kk': 'Оқыту үшін бірнеше кеңістірушілер', 'lt': 'Įvairūs prieštaravimai mokymo kliūčių mažinimui', 'mk': 'Diverse Adversaries for Mitigating Bias in Training', 'ms': 'Adversaries Miscellaneous for Mitigating Bias in Training', 'mt': 'Adversarji Diversi għat-Tnaqqis tal-Bias fit-Taħriġ', 'no': 'Diverse rekkefølgjer for forstørringar i trening', 'ml': 'പരിശീലനത്തില്\u200d മീറ്റിങ്ങ് ബിയാസുകള്\u200dക്ക് വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mn': 'Сургуульт дасгал хөдөлгөөний биеийн төлөвлөгч', 'ro': 'Diferite adversare pentru atenuarea Bias în formare', 'sr': 'Razni savetnici za mijenjanje biša u obuci', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Talobixiyayaasha kala duduwan ee waxbarashada', 'sv': 'Olika negativa effekter för att mildra missförhållanden i utbildning', 'pl': 'Różne przeciwniki do łagodzenia uprzedzeń w szkoleniu', 'ta': 'பயிற்சியில் பையை கலக்குவதற்கான வித்தியாசமான முன்விவரங்கள்', 'ur': 'ٹرینینگ میں میٹ گیٹنگ بیس کے لئے مختلف کنوارس', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Разнообразни противоречия за смекчаване на предразсъдъците в обучението', 'da': 'Forskellige modvirkninger for mindskelse af bias i uddannelse', 'de': 'Diverse Widersacher zur Minderung von Vorurteilen im Training', 'nl': 'Diverse nadelen voor het verminderen van vooroordelen in training', 'ko': '서로 다른 상대는 훈련 중의 편견을 줄일 수 있다', 'hr': 'Različiti savjetnici za ublažavanje bica u obuci', 'fa': 'مبارزه\u200cهای مختلف برای تعلیم دوره\u200cهای متفاوت در آموزش', 'id': 'Berbeda-beda Adversaries untuk Mitigating Bias in Training', 'sw': 'Tofauti mbalimbali kwa ajili ya kuhamasisha Bias katika mafunzo', 'tr': 'Däpli Karýetleme Biýasy üçin üýtgeşmeler', 'af': 'Verskeie Rekursiewers vir Mitigating Bias in Oefening', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bn': 'প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য বিভিন্ন প্রাপক', 'az': 'M칲xt톛lif t톛hsil ed톛nl톛r', 'ca': 'Diversos adversaris per mitigar els inconvenients en la formació', 'bs': 'Različiti savjetnici za ublažavanje bica u obuci', 'sq': 'Kundërshtarët e ndryshëm për lehtësimin e dëmeve në trainimin', 'hy': 'Արժանքների նվազեցման բազմաթիվ հակառակորդներ', 'fi': 'Monipuoliset haitat koulutuksen vinoutumisen lieventämiseksi', 'et': 'Mitmesugused kõrvaltoimed koolituse kallakute leevendamiseks', 'cs': 'Různé nepříznivce pro zmírnění předsudků v tréninku', 'jv': 'Dijejer-jejer Adverênci kanggo mitigating Bias nang Triangkat', 'sk': 'Različni neželeni učinki za ublažitev pristranskosti pri usposabljanju', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Diverse Adversaries for Mitigating Bias in Training', 'he': 'מונגדים שונים כדי להקל על סבלנות באימונים'}
{'en': 'Adversarial learning can learn fairer and less biased models of language processing than standard training. However, current adversarial techniques only partially mitigate the problem of model bias, added to which their training procedures are often unstable. In this paper, we propose a novel approach to adversarial learning based on the use of multiple diverse discriminators, whereby discriminators are encouraged to learn orthogonal hidden representations from one another. Experimental results show that our method substantially improves over standard adversarial removal methods, in terms of reducing bias and stability of training.', 'ar': 'يمكن أن يتعلم التعلم العدائي نماذج أكثر عدلاً وأقل تحيزًا لمعالجة اللغة من التدريب القياسي. ومع ذلك ، فإن تقنيات الخصومة الحالية تخفف جزئيًا فقط من مشكلة تحيز النموذج ، إضافة إلى أن إجراءات التدريب الخاصة بهم غالبًا ما تكون غير مستقرة. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نهجًا جديدًا للتعلم العدائي يعتمد على استخدام العديد من المميزات المتنوعة ، حيث يتم تشجيع المميِّزين على تعلم التمثيلات الخفية المتعامدة من بعضهم البعض. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن طريقتنا تتحسن بشكل كبير على طرق إزالة الخصومة القياسية ، من حيث تقليل التحيز واستقرار التدريب.', 'fr': "L'apprentissage contradictoire permet d'apprendre des modèles de traitement du langage plus justes et moins biaisés que la formation standard. Cependant, les techniques contradictoires actuelles n'atténuent que partiellement le problème du biais des modèles, auquel s'ajoute le fait que leurs procédures de formation sont souvent instables. Dans cet article, nous proposons une nouvelle approche de l'apprentissage contradictoire basée sur l'utilisation de multiples discriminateurs divers, dans laquelle les discriminateurs sont encouragés à apprendre des représentations cachées orthogonales les uns des autres. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre méthode s'améliore considérablement par rapport aux méthodes classiques de suppression contradictoire, en termes de réduction des biais et de stabilité de l'entraînement.", 'pt': 'O aprendizado adversário pode aprender modelos de processamento de linguagem mais justos e menos tendenciosos do que o treinamento padrão. No entanto, as técnicas adversas atuais atenuam apenas parcialmente o problema do viés do modelo, somado ao qual seus procedimentos de treinamento geralmente são instáveis. Neste artigo, propomos uma nova abordagem para aprendizagem adversarial baseada no uso de vários discriminadores diversos, em que os discriminadores são encorajados a aprender representações ortogonais ocultas uns dos outros. Resultados experimentais mostram que nosso método melhora substancialmente em relação aos métodos padrão de remoção de adversários, em termos de redução de viés e estabilidade do treinamento.', 'es': 'El aprendizaje contradictorio puede aprender modelos de procesamiento del lenguaje más justos y menos sesgados que la formación estándar. Sin embargo, las técnicas adversarias actuales solo mitigan parcialmente el problema del sesgo del modelo, a lo que sus procedimientos de entrenamiento a menudo son inestables. En este artículo, proponemos un enfoque novedoso para el aprendizaje contradictorio basado en el uso de múltiples discriminadores diversos, mediante el cual se alienta a los discriminadores a aprender representaciones ortogonales ocultas entre sí. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro método mejora sustancialmente con respecto a los métodos estándar de eliminación de adversarios, en términos de reducir el sesgo y la estabilidad del entrenamiento.', 'ja': '対抗学習は、標準的なトレーニングよりも、より公平で偏りの少ない言語処理のモデルを学ぶことができる。しかし、現在の対立的手法は、モデルバイアスの問題を部分的に緩和するだけであり、それに加えて、彼らのトレーニング手順はしばしば不安定である。本稿では，複数の多様な識別子の使用に基づく対立学習への新たなアプローチを提案し，識別子は互いに直交する隠れた表現を学ぶことを奨励する．実験結果は、トレーニングの偏りと安定性を減らすという点で、当社の方法が標準的な対抗除去方法よりも実質的に改善されることを示しています。', 'zh': '对抗性学可学平于格练,更少偏见之言。 然今之对抗性术,止于偏差,自此以外,其训练程序往往不定。 于本文,立鉴别器对抗性新术,以劝鉴别器相学正交隐。 实验结果表明,比之格对抗性去法,其法减偏练稳定性有大改进。', 'hi': 'प्रतिकूल शिक्षा मानक प्रशिक्षण की तुलना में भाषा प्रसंस्करण के निष्पक्ष और कम पक्षपाती मॉडल सीख सकती है। हालांकि, वर्तमान प्रतिकूल तकनीकें केवल आंशिक रूप से मॉडल पूर्वाग्रह की समस्या को कम करती हैं, जिसमें जोड़ा जाता है कि उनकी प्रशिक्षण प्रक्रियाएं अक्सर अस्थिर होती हैं। इस पत्र में, हम कई विविध भेदभावियों के उपयोग के आधार पर प्रतिकूल सीखने के लिए एक उपन्यास दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिससे भेदभाव करने वालों को एक-दूसरे से ऑर्थोगोनल छिपे हुए अभ्यावेदन सीखने के लिए प्रोत्साहित किया जाता है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारी विधि पूर्वाग्रह और प्रशिक्षण की स्थिरता को कम करने के मामले में, मानक प्रतिकूल हटाने के तरीकों पर काफी सुधार करती है।', 'ru': 'Состязательное обучение может научиться более справедливым и менее предвзятым моделям обработки языка, чем стандартное обучение. Однако нынешние состязательные методы лишь частично смягчают проблему смещения модели, в дополнение к чему их тренировочные процедуры часто нестабильны. В этой статье мы предлагаем новый подход к состязательному обучению, основанный на использовании множества разнообразных дискриминаторов, в соответствии с которым дискриминаторы поощряются к изучению ортогональных скрытых представлений друг от друга. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наш метод существенно улучшается по сравнению со стандартными методами состязательного удаления, с точки зрения снижения предвзятости и стабильности тренировки.', 'ga': 'Is féidir le foghlaim sháraíochta samhlacha próiseála teanga a fhoghlaim atá níos cothroime agus nach bhfuil chomh claonta céanna ná an oiliúint chaighdeánach. Mar sin féin, ní mhaolaíonn teicnící sáraíochta atá ann faoi láthair ach go páirteach fadhb na laofachta sa tsamhail, agus is minic a bhíonn a nósanna imeachta oiliúna éagobhsaí leis. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid cur chuige nua maidir le foghlaim sháraíochta bunaithe ar úsáid a bhaint as il-idirdhealaithe éagsúla, ina spreagtar na hidirdhealaithe chun léirithe ceilte orthogonal a fhoghlaim óna chéile. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go dtagann feabhas suntasach ar ár modh thar na modhanna caighdeánacha sáraíochta a bhaint, i dtéarmaí claonadh agus cobhsaíocht oiliúna a laghdú.', 'el': 'Η αρνητική μάθηση μπορεί να μάθει πιο δίκαια και λιγότερο προκατειλημμένα μοντέλα γλωσσικής επεξεργασίας από ό,τι η τυπική εκπαίδευση. Ωστόσο, οι σημερινές τεχνικές αντιπαράθεσης μετριάζουν μόνο εν μέρει το πρόβλημα της προκατάληψης του μοντέλου, στην οποία προστίθενται οι διαδικασίες κατάρτισης τους συχνά είναι ασταθείς. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε μια νέα προσέγγιση στην αντικρουστική μάθηση βασισμένη στη χρήση πολλαπλών διαφορετικών διακρίσεων, με την οποία οι διακρίσεις ενθαρρύνονται να μάθουν ορθογώνιες κρυφές αναπαραστάσεις ο ένας από τον άλλο. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας βελτιώνεται σημαντικά σε σχέση με τις συνήθεις μεθόδους αφαίρεσης αντιπάλου, όσον αφορά τη μείωση της προκατάληψης και τη σταθερότητα της εκπαίδευσης.', 'hu': 'A negatív tanulás a szokásos képzésnél igazságosabb és kevésbé elfogultabb nyelvi feldolgozási modelleket tanulhat. A jelenlegi ellentétes technikák azonban csak részben enyhítik a modell elfogultságának problémáját, amelyhez hozzáadva a képzési eljárások gyakran instabilak. Ebben a tanulmányban egy új megközelítést javasolunk az ellentétes tanulásra, amely többféle diszkriminatív személy használatán alapul, és amelyben a diszkriminatív személyeket arra ösztönzik, hogy egymástól megtanulják az ortogonális rejtett reprezentációkat. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk jelentősen javul a standard ellentétes eltávolítási módszerekhez képest, ami csökkenti az edzés elfogultságát és stabilitását.', 'ka': 'კონდერსარიალური სწავლება შეიძლება უფრო მსგავსი და უფრო მსგავსი ენის პროცესის მოდელები ვიდრე სტანდარტური სტრინტური სტრი მაგრამ, მიმდინარე ანტერარიალური ტექნოგიები მხოლოდ ნაწილად მოდელური წარმოდგენების პრობლემას დამატებული, რომელსაც მათი განაკეთებული პრობლემები ზო ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ მინდომენეთ ნომალური დავსწავლობა განსახვავებული დისკრიმინატორის გამოყენებაზე, რომელიც დისკრიმინატორიები იყენებენ ერთმანეთისგან ორტოდონალური დაკლეულების გამოყენება ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები ჩვენი მედიოდი ძალიან უფრო მეტირებს სტანდარტური განმავლის მედიოდზე, რომელიც განმავლობაში უფრო მეტირებით და სტანდარტურის', 'it': "L'apprendimento avverso può imparare modelli di elaborazione linguistica più equi e meno parziali rispetto alla formazione standard. Tuttavia, le attuali tecniche avversarie mitigano solo parzialmente il problema della polarizzazione del modello, a cui si aggiungono le loro procedure di allenamento spesso instabili. In questo articolo, proponiamo un nuovo approccio all'apprendimento avversario basato sull'uso di molteplici discriminatori diversi, in cui i discriminanti sono incoraggiati a imparare rappresentazioni ortogonali nascoste l'uno dall'altro. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il nostro metodo migliora notevolmente rispetto ai metodi di rimozione avversaria standard, in termini di riduzione del bias e della stabilità dell'allenamento.", 'mk': 'Напротивното учење може да научи пофер и помалку пристрасни модели на обработување јазик отколку стандардна обука. Сепак, актуелните противници техники само делумно го намалуваат проблемот со моделните предрасуди, додадени на кои нивните процедури на обука честопати се нестабилни. Во овој весник предложуваме нов пристап кон противно учење базиран на употребата на повеќе различни дискриминатори, со кои дискриминаторите се охрабрени да научат ортогонски скриени претставувања еден од друг. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот метод значително се подобрува во однос на стандардните методи на отстранување на противниците, во поглед на намалувањето на предрасудите и стабилноста на обуката.', 'lt': 'Nepageidaujamas mokymasis gali išmokti sąžiningesnių ir mažiau sąžiningų kalbų apdorojimo modelių nei standartinis mokymas. Tačiau dabartiniai prieštaringi metodai tik iš dalies sumažina modelio pusiausvyros problem ą, prie kurios dažnai jų mokymo procedūros nestabilios. Šiame dokumente siūlome naują požiūrį į priešingą mokymąsi, pagrįstą daugelio įvairių diskriminatorių naudojimu, pagal kurį diskriminatoriai skatinami iš vienos kitos mokytis ortogoninių paslėptų atstovybių. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų metodas gerokai pagerėja, palyginti su standartiniais prieštaringų pašalinimo metodais, siekiant sumažinti sąžiningumą ir mokymo stabilumą.', 'mt': 'It-tagħlim avversarju jista’ jitgħallem mudelli ta’ pproċessar tal-lingwi aktar ġusti u inqas preġusti mit-taħriġ standard. Madankollu, it-tekniki avversarji attwali jnaqqsu biss parzjalment il-problema tal-preġudizzju tal-mudell, miżjuda magħha l-proċeduri ta’ taħriġ tagħhom spiss mhumiex stabbli. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu approċċ ġdid għat-tagħlim avversarju bbażat fuq l-użu ta’ diversi diskriminaturi, fejn id-diskriminaturi huma mħeġġa jitgħallmu rappreżentazzjonijiet ortogonali moħbija minn xulxin. Riżultati esperimentali juru li l-metodu tagħna jtejjeb b’mod sostanzjali fuq metodi standard ta’ tneħħija avversarja, f’termini ta’ tnaqqis tal-preġudizzju u l-istabbiltà tat-taħriġ.', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran menentang boleh belajar model pemprosesan bahasa yang lebih adil dan kurang bias daripada latihan piawai. Namun, teknik musuh semasa hanya sebahagian mengurangi masalah bias model, ditambah ke mana prosedur latihan mereka sering tidak stabil. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan pendekatan baru untuk belajar musuh berdasarkan penggunaan pelbagai diskriminasi berbeza, dimana diskriminasi diharapkan untuk belajar perwakilan ortogonal tersembunyi dari satu sama lain. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kita meningkat secara mendalam atas kaedah pembuangan musuh piawai, dalam terma mengurangi bias dan kestabilan latihan.', 'ml': 'ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d സാധാരണ പരിശീലനത്തെക്കാള്\u200d കുറച്ച് മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കാം. എന്നാലും ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ എതിര്\u200dക്കുന്ന സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d മാത്രം മോഡല്\u200d ബിയാസിന്റെ പ്രശ്നത്തെ ഭാഗികമായി മാറ്റുന്ന ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, പല വ്യത്യസ്ത വിവേകതകളുടെ ഉപയോഗിച്ച് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി വിരോധമായ പഠിക്കുന്ന നോവല്\u200d വഴിയില്\u200d നാം പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അതില്\u200d  Experimental results show that our method substantially improves over standard adversarial removal methods, in terms of reducing bias and stability of training.', 'no': 'Adversarial læring kan lære riktigere og mindre forskyvingsmodeller for språksbehandling enn standard trening. Dette er imidlertid gjeldande adversariske teknikkar berre delvis mindre problemet med modellen, som har lagt til at dei treningsprosedyrane ofte er ikkje stabile. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit nytt tilnærming til adversariske læring basert på bruken av fleire forskjellige diskriminasjonar, der diskriminasjonane blir oppretta til å lære orthogonale skjulte representasjonar frå kvarandre. Eksperimentale resultat viser at metoden vårt er vanleg forbetra over standardverdiar fjerningsmetoder, ved hjelp av å redusera forsiktighet og stabiliteten av opplæring.', 'kk': 'Конверсариялық оқыту стандартты оқытуға арналған тілдерді өңдеу үлгілерін оқытуға болады. Бірақ қазіргі негатриялық техникалар тек үлгіліктердің мәселесін бөлшектеу үшін, олардың оқыту процедурлері көбінде дұрыс емес болады. Бұл қағазда, біз қарсылық көптеген дискриминаторлардың қолдануына негізделген қарсылық оқытуға жаңа жағдай ұсынамыз. Бұл қағазда дискриминаторлардың бірінен ортогоналық жасырын таңбаларды үйрену үшін көме Эксперименталдық нәтижелер біздің әдіміміз стандартты қарсы өшіру әдістерін көбейту және оқыту тәуелдігін азайту үшін көбейтіп жасайды.', 'mn': 'Консультацийн суралцах нь хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн загваруудыг стандарт суралцахаас илүү шударга, бага зэрэгцээтэй загваруудыг сурах боломжтой. Гэвч одоогийн эсрэг техникууд нь зөвхөн загварын эсрэг загварын асуудлыг багасгаж, тэдний сургалтын процедур ихэвчлэн тогтвортой байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон янз бүрийн шийдвэрлэгчдийн хэрэглээнд багтаж эсрэг зан чанарын суралцах шинэ арга зам зааж өгдөг. Энэ арга зан чанарын хувьд ялгаачлагчдыг өөрсдөөсөө ортогонол нууцлагдсан үзүүлэлтийг сура Эмчилгээний үр дүнд бидний арга нь стандарт эсрэг устгах арга замыг багасгах болон сургалтын тогтвортой байдлыг багасгах боломжтой гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'Nauka przeciwna może uczyć się sprawiedliwszych i mniej stronniczych modeli przetwarzania języka niż standardowe szkolenia. Jednak obecne techniki przeciwnikowe tylko częściowo łagodzą problem uprzedzeń modelowych, dodatkowo ich procedury szkoleniowe są często niestabilne. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nowatorskie podejście do uczenia się przeciwników oparte na wykorzystaniu wielu różnych dyskryminatorów, dzięki czemu dyskryminatorzy są zachęcani do uczenia się ortogonalnych ukrytych reprezentacji od siebie nawzajem. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasza metoda znacznie ulepsza się w porównaniu ze standardowymi metodami usuwania przeciwników, pod względem zmniejszenia stronniczości i stabilności treningu.', 'ro': 'Învățarea adversă poate învăța modele mai echitabile și mai puțin părtinitoare de procesare a limbilor decât formarea standard. Cu toate acestea, tehnicile adversare actuale atenuează doar parțial problema părtinirii modelului, adăugată la care procedurile lor de formare sunt adesea instabile. În această lucrare, propunem o abordare nouă a învățării adversare bazată pe utilizarea mai multor discriminatori diverși, prin care discriminatorii sunt încurajați să învețe reprezentări ortogonale ascunse unul de la celălalt. Rezultatele experimentale arată că metoda noastră se îmbunătățește substanțial față de metodele standard de îndepărtare adversară, în ceea ce privește reducerea părtinirii și stabilității antrenamentului.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වඩා සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වටින් භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වඩා සාමාන්\u200dය සහ ප්\u200dරශ නමුත්, දැන් විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dතිකාරය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි, ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරශ මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා විරෝද්ධ විශේෂ විශේෂ කරුණාකරුවන්ගේ භාවිත විදියට විශේෂ කරුණාකරුවන්ගේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ස පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වනවා අපේ විධානය සාමාන්\u200dය විරුද්ධ විනාශ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිචා', 'sr': 'Predstavno učenje može naučiti poštenije i manje predrasude modele obrade jezika nego standardnu obuku. Međutim, trenutne neprijateljske tehnike samo delimično smanjuju problem modelne pristrasnosti, dodanom kojima su njihove postupke obuke često nestabilne. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi pristup neprijateljskom učenju baziranom na upotrebi višestrukih različitih diskriminacija, kojim se diskriminacije ohrabruju da nauče ortogonalne skrivene predstave jedni od drugih. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naša metoda značajno poboljšava standardne metode uklanjanja neprijateljskih metoda u smislu smanjenja pristrasnosti i stabilnosti obuke.', 'so': 'Waxbarashada horaadka ah waxay baran kartaa noocyada baaraandegista luqada si ka fiican oo ka yar qaabilsan waxbarashada caadiga ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qalabka cadaawayaasha ah ee hada la joogo waxay qayb ahaan u dhaqaaqi karaan dhibaatada dabeecada, waxaana lagu dari karaa qalabka waxbarashadoodu ay marar badan taageeri yihiin. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa qaabilaad ku qoran waxbarashada cadaawayaasha ah oo lagu saleynayo isticmaalka takoorida kala duduwan, kaas oo lagu dhiirrigeliyo takoorida si ay u bartaan noocyo qarsoon. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in qaababkayaga aad ugu hormariya qaababka guuritaanka ee caadiga ah ee ka geesta ah, marka la hoos mariyo tababarka iyo stabilista waxbarashada.', 'ta': 'மொழி செயல்படுத்தலின் மாதிரிகளை நிலையான பயிற்சியை விட சிறந்த மற்றும் குறைந்த மாதிரிகளை கற்றலாம். However, current adversarial techniques only partially mitigate the problem of model bias, added to which their training procedures are often unstable.  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் பல வித்தியாசமான விவாதிப்பாளர்களை பயன்படுத்தும் அடிப்படையில் எதிர்பார்த்த கற்றலுக்கு ஒரு புதிய செயல்பாட்டை நிர்ணயி முயற்சி முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது நமது முறையில் நிலையான எதிர்பார்வை நீக்கும் முறைகளை மேல் மேம்படுத்துகிறது, பய', 'sv': 'Adversarial inlärning kan lära sig rättvisare och mindre partiska modeller av språkbearbetning än standardutbildning. Nuvarande motstridstekniker mildrar dock endast delvis problemet med modellfördomar, och dessutom är deras utbildningsförfaranden ofta instabila. I denna uppsats föreslår vi ett nytt tillvägagångssätt för kontradiktoriskt lärande baserat på användning av flera olika diskriminerare, där diskriminerare uppmuntras att lära sig ortogonala dolda representationer av varandra. Experimentella resultat visar att vår metod avsevärt förbättras jämfört med vanliga motprestationsmetoder, när det gäller att minska bias och stabilitet i träning.', 'ur': 'منصفات کی تعلیم استاندارڈ ترین سے زیادہ عادلانہ اور کم منصفات کی موڈل سکتی ہے۔ However, current adversarial techniques only partially mitigate the problem of model bias, added to which their training procedures are often unstable. اس کاغذ میں ہم مخالف مختلف مختلف فرق کرنے والوں کے استعمال پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں، جس کے ذریعہ مختلف فرق کرنے والوں کو ایک دوسرے سے مختلف مخفی نمونات کی تعلیم سکھانے کی رغبت دی جاتی ہے. Experimental results show that our method substantially improves over standard adversarial removal methods, in terms of reducing bias and stability of training.', 'uz': "Bir necha ta'lim o'rganish andoza taʼminlovchi holatdan juda yaxshi va cheksiz o'xshash modellarni o'rganadi. Lekin hozir taʼminlovchi texnologiyani faqat qismi model bias muammolarini kamaytirish mumkin, ularning taʼminlovchi vazifalari ko'pincha muvaffaqiyatli ham qoʻshish mumkin. In this paper, we propose a novel approach to adversarial learning based on the use of multiple diverse discriminators, whereby discriminators are encouraged to learn orthogonal hidden representations from one another.  Tajriba natijalari ko'rsatadi, bizning usuli standard olib tashlash usullarini o'zgartiradi. Taʼminlov sohasini va taʼminlov sohasini kamaytirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Cách học làm gương có thể học cách xử lý ngôn ngữ công bằng và ít thiên vị hơn cả giáo dục. Tuy nhiên, kỹ thuật đối nghịch hiện nay chỉ giảm bớt một phần vấn đề về khuynh hướng mô hình, thêm vào đó thủ tục đào tạo của họ thường bất ổn. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp mới về học tập đối nghịch dựa trên việc sử dụng nhiều kẻ phân biệt chủng tộc, nhờ đó người phân biệt được khuyến khích học những biểu hiện bí mật của người khác. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta cải thiện đáng kể hơn phương pháp triệt tiêu tiêu chuẩn nhằm giảm khuynh hướng và ổn định giáo dục.', 'hr': 'Preporučno učenje može naučiti ispravniji i manje pristrasno modele obrade jezika nego standardnu obuku. Međutim, trenutne neprijateljske tehnike samo djelomično smanjuju problem modelne pristrasnosti, dodane kojima su njihove postupke obuke često nestabilne. U ovom papiru predlažemo nov pristup neprijateljskom učenju na temelju upotrebe višestrukih različitih diskriminacija, kojim se diskriminacije ohrabruju učiti ortogonalne skrivene predstave jedni od drugih. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da se naš metod značajno poboljšava na standardne metode uklanjanja neprijateljskih metoda u smislu smanjenja pristrasnosti i stabilnosti obuke.', 'bg': 'Неблагоприятното обучение може да научи по-справедливи и по-малко предубедени модели на езикова обработка от стандартното обучение. Въпреки това, настоящите противоречиви техники само частично смекчават проблема с моделните пристрастия, към които техните процедури за обучение често са нестабилни. В настоящата статия предлагаме нов подход към съперническото учене въз основа на използването на множество различни дискриминатори, чрез който дискриминаторите се насърчават да научат ортогонални скрити представи един от друг. Експерименталните резултати показват, че методът ни значително се подобрява спрямо стандартните методи за отстраняване на конкуренцията по отношение на намаляването на пристрастията и стабилността на обучението.', 'nl': 'Tegenstrijdig leren kan eerlijkere en minder bevooroordeelde modellen van taalverwerking leren dan standaard training. De huidige tegenstrijdige technieken beperken echter slechts gedeeltelijk het probleem van model bias, waarbij hun trainingsprocedures vaak onstabiel zijn. In dit artikel stellen we een nieuwe benadering voor van tegenstrijdig leren gebaseerd op het gebruik van meerdere verschillende discriminatoren, waarbij discriminatoren worden aangemoedigd orthogonale verborgen representaties van elkaar te leren. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat onze methode aanzienlijk verbetert ten opzichte van standaard antipartiële verwijderingsmethoden, wat betreft het verminderen van bias en stabiliteit van training.', 'da': 'Modsat læring kan lære mere retfærdige og mindre fordomsfulde modeller for sprogbehandling end standard uddannelse. De nuværende modstridende teknikker afhjælper imidlertid kun delvist problemet med modelforstyrrelser, hvortil deres træningsprocedurer ofte er ustabile. I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny tilgang til modstridende læring baseret på brug af flere forskellige diskriminerende personer, hvor diskriminerende opfordres til at lære ortogonale skjulte repræsentationer fra hinanden. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores metode forbedres væsentligt i forhold til standard modstandsdygtige fjernelsesmetoder, hvad angår reduktion af skævhed og stabilitet i træningen.', 'de': 'Gegensätzliches Lernen kann fairere und weniger voreingenommene Modelle der Sprachverarbeitung erlernen als herkömmliche Schulungen. Gegenwärtige Techniken mindern jedoch nur teilweise das Problem der Modellverzerrung, zu dem ihre Trainingsabläufe oft instabil sind. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir einen neuartigen Ansatz des kontradiktoriellen Lernens vor, der auf der Verwendung mehrerer verschiedener Diskriminierer basiert, wobei Diskriminierer ermutigt werden, orthogonale versteckte Repräsentationen voneinander zu lernen. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass sich unsere Methode gegenüber herkömmlichen Methoden zur Entfernung von Gegensätzen erheblich verbessert, was die Reduzierung von Bias und Stabilität des Trainings betrifft.', 'ko': '표준 교육에 비해 대항적 학습은 공평하고 편견이 적은 언어 처리 모델을 배울 수 있다.그러나 현재의 대항 기술은 모델의 편차를 부분적으로 완화할 수 있을 뿐이고 그들의 훈련 절차는 불안정하다.본고에서 우리는 여러 개의 서로 다른 감별기를 바탕으로 하는 대항적 학습의 새로운 방법을 제시하여 감별기가 서로 학습하고 숨겨진 표현을 하도록 장려했다.실험 결과에 따르면 우리의 방법은 훈련의 편차와 안정성을 줄이는 데 있어서 표준적인 대항성 제거 방법보다 현저한 개선이 있었다.', 'tr': 'Mahsurat öwrenmek standart okuwçysyndan adalat we azajyk nusgalary öwrenip biler. Ýöne häzirki täsirli teknikleriň diňe nusgasyzlyklaryň meseläni biraz azaltýar, okuwçylyklarynyň düzgünlerine köplenç däldikleri üçin eklenýär. Bu kagyzda, bir näçe çeşitli diskriminatçylar ulanylara daýanýan teňgaly öwrenmek üçin bir roman approach teklip edýäris we diskriminatçylar bir-birinden gizli suratlary öwrenmek üçin gurnalýarlar. Experimental netijelerimiz biziň metodamyzyň standart teňkil çykarma yöntemlerini azaltmak we eğitim çykarmak üçin örän gowydygyny görkezýär.', 'sw': 'Ufunzi wa kitaifa unaweza kujifunza mifano bora na ndogo ya upendeleo wa upendeleo wa lugha kuliko mafunzo ya kawaida. Hata hivyo, mbinu za sasa zinazotokana na upinzani tu zinapunguza tatizo la upinzani wa mifano, na kuongezwa na upasuaji wa mafunzo mara nyingi usio imara. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza njia ya riwaya ya kujifunza upinzani kwa kutumia matumizi ya wabaguzi mbalimbali, ambapo wabaguzi wanahamasishwa kujifunza uwakilishi wa kigaidi wa kujificha kwa wenyewe. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu inaboresha kwa kiasi kikubwa zaidi ya njia za kuondolewa kwa njia za kawaida za upinzani, kwa sababu ya kupunguza upendeleo na ustawi wa mafunzo.', 'fa': 'یادگیری مصنوعی می تواند مدل\u200cهای پرداخت زبان عادلانه و کمتر از آموزش استاندارد یاد بگیرد. ولی تکنیک های مخالف فعلی اکنون تنها بخشی از مشکل تغییر مدل را کاهش می دهد، و به آن اضافه می شود که روش آموزش آنها اغلب ثابت نیستند. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش نویی برای یادگیری دشمنی بر اساس استفاده از متفاوت جدایی\u200cکننده\u200cهای مختلف، که به وسیله آن جدایی\u200cکننده\u200cها تشویق می\u200cکنند که نمایش\u200cهای مخفی orthogonal را از یکدیگر یاد بگیرند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cی ما نشان می\u200cدهند که روش ما در روش\u200cهای خلاف استاندارد، با توجه به کاهش تعادل و استواری آموزش، زیاد بهتر می\u200cشود.', 'af': "Adversariële leer kan regter en minder voorspoedige modele van taal verwerking leer as standaard onderwerp. Maar die huidige teenstandaarie teknike maak net gedeeltelik die probleem van model bias, bygevoeg waarmee hulle onderwerp prosedure dikwels onstadig is. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n nuwe toegang tot teenwoordige leer gebaseer op die gebruik van veelvuldige verskeie diskrimineerders, waarmee diskrimineerders aanbevestig word om orthogonale verborge voorstellings van mekaar te leer. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat ons metode substantieel verbeter oor standaard teenstandaarde verwydering metodes, terwyl ons voorspoedige en stabiliteit van onderwerp reduseer.", 'hy': 'Հակառակորդ ուսումնասիրությունը կարող է սովորել լեզվի վերամշակման ավելի արդար և պակաս կողմնակի մոդելներ, քան ստանդարտ ուսումնասիրությունը: Այնուամենայնիվ, ներկայիս հակառակյալ տեխնիկաները միայն մասամբ նվազեցնում են մոդելների կողմնականության խնդիրը, որն ավելացնում է, որ նրանց ուսուցման գործընթացները հաճախ անկայուն են: In this paper, we propose a novel approach to adversarial learning based on the use of multiple diverse discriminators, whereby discriminators are encouraged to learn orthogonal hidden representations from one another.  Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը նշանակաբար բարելավվում է հակառակյալ վերացման ստանդարտ մեթոդների դեմ՝ նվազեցնելով կողմնականությունը և մարզի կայունությունը:', 'sq': 'Mësimi kundërshtar mund të mësojë modele më të drejtë dhe më pak të parëndësishme të procesimit të gjuhës sesa trajnimi standard. Megjithatë, teknikat e tanishme kundërshtare vetëm pjesërisht lehtësojnë problemin e paragjykimit të modelit, të cilin shtohen procedurat e tyre të trajnimit shpesh të paqëndrueshme. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një metodë të re për mësimin kundërshtar bazuar në përdorimin e diskriminuesve të shumëfishtë të ndryshëm, me të cilën diskriminuesit janë inkurajuar të mësojnë përfaqësime ortogonale të fshehura nga njëri-tjetri. Experimental results show that our method substantially improves over standard adversarial removal methods, in terms of reducing bias and stability of training.', 'id': 'Pelajaran adversial dapat belajar model proses bahasa yang lebih adil dan kurang bias daripada pelatihan standar. Namun, teknik lawan saat ini hanya sebagian mengurangi masalah bias model, ditambah di mana prosedur pelatihan mereka sering tidak stabil. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan pendekatan baru untuk belajar musuh berdasarkan penggunaan berbagai diskriminasi, dimana diskriminasi didorong untuk belajar persembahan rahasia ortogonal dari satu sama lain. Experimental results show that our method substantially improves over standard adversarial removal methods, in terms of reducing bias and stability of training.', 'am': 'የፊደል ትምህርት መምህርት ከደካማነት ትምህርት ይልቅ የበለጠ እና የቋንቋ ፕሮጀክት ምሳሌዎችን ማርቅ ይችላል፡፡ ነገር ግን የአሁኑ ተቃዋሚዎች የሞዴል ብያሽን ጉዳይ እኩል ማቅረብ ብቻ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ በብዙ ልዩ ተቃዋሚዎች በመጠቀም በተቃዋሚ ትምህርት ላይ የሚደረገውን የረኀብ ልውቀት እናሳስባታለን፡፡ ፈተና ፍሬዎች የግንኙነት እና ትምህርት ማቀናቀል እና ትምህርት ማሰናከል ስርዓታችን በተቃዋሚ ተቃውሞ ማስወገድ በሚያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'bn': 'প্রাক্তন শিক্ষা স্ট্যান্ডারেন্ড প্রশিক্ষণের চেয়ে ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার পরিচালনার মোডেল শিখতে পারে। However, current adversarial techniques only partially mitigate the problem of model bias, added to which their training procedures are often unstable.  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বিভিন্ন বৈষম্যের ব্যবহারের উপরে বিরোধী শিক্ষা প্রস্তাব করার একটি উপন্যাস প্রস্তাব করি, যেখানে বৈষম্যেরা একে অপরের কাছ থেকে লুকিয়ে  পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি স্থানীয় বিরোধী অপসারণের মাধ্যমে উন্নত হয়েছে, প্রশিক্ষণের বিরুদ্ধে বিরোধী প্রশিক্ষণ', 'cs': 'Nepřátelské učení se může naučit spravedlivější a méně zaujaté modely zpracování jazyka než standardní školení. Současné kontroverzní techniky však jen částečně zmírňují problém modelového biasu, k němuž jsou jejich tréninkové postupy často nestabilní. V tomto článku navrhujeme nový přístup k protivnímu učení založený na použití více různých diskriminačních látek, přičemž diskriminační osoby jsou podporovány, aby se od sebe učili ortogonální skryté reprezentace. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že naše metoda se výrazně zlepšuje oproti standardním metodám odstraňování protivníků, pokud jde o snížení zaujatosti a stabilitu tréninku.', 'bs': 'Predstavno učenje može naučiti fer i manje predrasude modele obrade jezika nego standardnu obuku. Međutim, trenutne neprijateljske tehnike samo djelomično smanjuju problem modelne pristrasnosti, dodane kojima su njihove postupke obuke često nestabilne. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi pristup neprijateljskom učenju baziranom na upotrebi višestrukih različitih diskriminacija, kojim se diskriminacije ohrabruju da nauče ortogonalne skrivene predstave jedni od drugih. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naša metoda značajno poboljšava standardne metode uklanjanja neprijateljskih metoda u smislu smanjenja pristrasnosti i stabilnosti obuke.', 'az': 'Müəllif öyrənmək standart təhsil etməsindən daha ədalətli və daha az təsirli dil işləməsi modellərini öyrənə bilər. Ancaq hökmünün düşmənçilik teknikləri yalnızca modellərin təsirlərinin problemini azaltır, onların təhsil prosedürlərinin çox səbəb istiqamətləşdirilməsi üçün əlavə edilmişdir. Bu kağızda, çoxlu müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müşriklərin istifadəsinə dayanan düşmənçilik öyrənməsinə yeni bir tərzim təklif edirik. Bu tərzdə müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müşriklərin istifadəsinə Experimental sonuçları göstərir ki, bizim metodumuzun standart düşmənçi silmə metodları üzərində, təhsil göstərilməsi və təhsil istiqabiliyyətini azaltmaq məqsədilə çox yaxşılaşdırır.', 'ca': "L'aprenentatge adversari pot aprendre models de processament de llenguatges més justs i menys imparcials que l'entrenament normal. No obstant això, les tècniques adversaries actuals només mitiguen parcialment el problema del bias del model, a la qual els seus procediments de formació sovint són instables. En aquest paper, proposem una nova abordagem a l'aprenentatge adversari basada en l'ús de múltiples discriminators diversos, amb la qual els discriminators s'estimen a aprendre representacions ocultes ortogonals entre ells. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre mètode millora substancialment sobre els mètodes standard d'eliminació adversaria, en termes de reducció de bias i estabilitat de l'entrenament.", 'et': 'Kõrvaleõpe võib õppida õiglasemaid ja vähem erapooletuid keeletöötluse mudeleid kui tavaline koolitus. Samas leevendavad praegused vastased meetodid vaid osaliselt mudeli kallutamise probleemi, millele lisandub nende koolitusprotseduurid sageli ebastabiilsed. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uudse lähenemisviisi vastastikusele õppimisele, mis põhineb mitmete erinevate diskrimineerijate kasutamisel, kus diskrimineerijaid julgustatakse õppima ortogonaalseid varjatud esitusi üksteiselt. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie meetod paraneb oluliselt võrreldes standardsete vastaste eemaldamismeetoditega, vähendades harjutuse kallakut ja stabiilsust.', 'fi': 'Vastavuoroinen oppiminen voi oppia oikeudenmukaisempia ja vähemmän puolueellisia kielinkäsittelymalleja kuin tavallinen koulutus. Nykyaikaiset vastakkainasettelutekniikat kuitenkin lieventävät vain osittain malliharhan ongelmaa, minkä lisäksi niiden koulutusmenettelyt ovat usein epävakaita. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uudenlaista lähestymistapaa kontradiktoriseen oppimiseen, joka perustuu useiden erilaisten diskriminaattoreiden käyttöön, jossa diskriminaattoreita kannustetaan oppimaan ortogonaalisia piilotettuja representaatioita toisiltaan. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että menetelmämme paranee huomattavasti tavanomaisiin vastustajien poistomenetelmiin verrattuna vähentäen puolueellisuutta ja harjoittelun vakautta.', 'jv': 'Advertary Learning politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Nang kuwi iki, kita nggunakake téhine kanggo ingkang karo pakan-ingkang pakan sing basa gambar nggambar aturan winih pakan dengan pamirno sing wis dipulangan, lan ning daerahé pirsak-pirsak nguasai winih dhéwé. Rasané sing paling nggambar uwong kelas kuwi tindakan tentang supayat karo awak dhéwé, nik awak dhéwé kuwi mau basa sing bakal nguasai bias lan tambahan dhéwé.', 'sk': 'Neželeno učenje se lahko nauči pravičnejših in manj pristranskih modelov jezikovne obdelave kot standardno usposabljanje. Vendar pa sedanje kontradikcijske tehnike le delno ublažijo problem pristranskosti modela, ki je dodan njihovi postopki usposabljanja pogosto nestabilni. V prispevku predlagamo nov pristop k konkurenčnemu učenju, ki temelji na uporabi več različnih diskriminatorjev, pri čemer diskriminatorje spodbujamo k učenju ortogonalnih skritih reprezentacij drug od drugega. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da se naša metoda bistveno izboljša v primerjavi s standardnimi metodami odstranjevanja kontradiktorjev v smislu zmanjšanja pristranskosti in stabilnosti treninga.', 'ha': "Babu karatun masu ƙaranci kan zan iya sanar da masu kyakkyawan da ke ƙaranci misãlai masu aiki da harshe ko kuwa na tsari da taƙaitacce. Amma, masu motsi da ake kai yanzu kawai, suna ƙara matsalar masu motsi, da kuma a ƙara, da wasu matsalar masu yin amfani da su ko daidai. Daga wannan takardan, Munã ƙarfafa wani matsayi ya iya karɓi karkacin da za'a iya amfani da abincin masu motsi, masu bastarwa masu yawa, da shi ana ƙara wa masu yin masu yin takarda, su sanar masu bakarãri masu ɓõyewa daga ɗayan. Matarin jarrabai na nũna cewa metodinmu yana ƙari mai girma bisa hanyoyin tafiyar da kawaici na taƙaita, a cikin ƙaranci taƙaita da tabbatarwa na aikin aiki.", 'he': 'הלימודים ההתנגדים יכולים ללמוד מודלים הוגנים ופחות מוצדים של עיבוד שפה מאשר אימונים סטנדרטיים. עם זאת, טכניקות נוגדות הנוכחיות רק חלקית להקל את הבעיה של ההתמחות מודל, שהוספת אליה הליך האימונים שלהם לעתים קרובות לא יציב. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים גישה חדשה ללימוד יריבי מבוססת על השימוש של מספר מגוונים מגוונים, תוצאות ניסויים מראות שהשיטה שלנו משתפרת באופן משמעותי על שיטות הסירה היריבים הסטנדרטיות, בנוגע להפחית ההתמחות והיציבות של האימון.', 'bo': 'སྔོན་བསྐྱུར་གྱི་སློབ་དཔྱད་དེ་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་ལས་རིམ་པ་ལས་ཉུང་བའི་མིག་དཔེ་གཞི་འགྱུར ཡིན་ནའང་། ད་ལྟོའི་གདོང་ལེན་བྱེད་མཁན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཚོའི་དབྱིབས་ཀྱི་ཆེད་དུ་བཏོན་གཏོང་ན། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གདོང་ལེན་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་གསར་བ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Experimental results show that our method is substantially improved over standard adversarial removal methods, in terms of reducing bias and stability of training.'}
{'en': '‘Just because you are right, does n’t mean I am wrong’ : Overcoming a bottleneck in development and evaluation of Open-Ended VQA tasks', 'ar': '"لمجرد أنك على حق ، لا يعني أنني مخطئ": التغلب على عقبة في تطوير وتقييم مهام VQA المفتوحة', 'es': '«Solo porque tengas razón, no significa que me equivoque»: Superar un cuello de botella en el desarrollo y la evaluación de las tareas de VQA abiertas', 'fr': "«\xa0Ce n'est pas parce que vous avez raison que je me trompe\xa0»\xa0: Surmonter un goulot d'étranglement dans le développement et l'évaluation des tâches VQA ouvertes", 'pt': "`Só porque você está certo, não significa que eu esteja errado': superando um gargalo no desenvolvimento e avaliação de tarefas VQA Open-Ended", 'ja': '「あなたが正しいからといって、私が間違っているわけではありません」：オープンエンドのVQAタスクの開発と評価におけるボトルネックを克服する', 'zh': '"徒以子为是,非我过也":克开放式VQA开估之瓶颈也', 'ru': '«Только потому, что вы правы, не означает, что я ошибаюсь»: Преодоление узкого места в разработке и оценке открытых задач VQA', 'hi': "'सिर्फ इसलिए कि आप सही हैं, इसका मतलब यह नहीं है कि मैं गलत हूं': ओपन-एंडेड वीक्यूए कार्यों के विकास और मूल्यांकन में एक बाधा पर काबू पाने", 'ga': "`Díreach mar go bhfuil an ceart agat, ní chiallaíonn sé go bhfuil mé mícheart': Scrogall a shárú i bhforbairt agus i measúnú tascanna VQA Ceann Oscailte", 'ka': '"მხოლოდ რადგან თქვენ მართალია, არ ნიშნავს, რომ მე არ ვარ შეცდომა": გადავიწყეთ ბრძელი გავაკეთება და გავაკეთება გადასრულებული VQA დავალებების შესახებ', 'el': '"Ακριβώς επειδή έχετε δίκιο, δεν σημαίνει ότι κάνω λάθος": Να ξεπεράσουμε ένα εμπόδιο στην ανάπτυξη και αξιολόγηση των εργασιών ανοικτού τέλους', 'hu': "'Csak azért, mert igazad van, nem jelenti azt, hogy tévedek': A nyílt végű VQA feladatok fejlesztésének és értékelésének szűk keresztmetszetének leküzdése", 'it': "'Solo perché hai ragione, non significa che io abbia torto': Superare un collo di bottiglia nello sviluppo e nella valutazione delle attività Open-Ended VQA", 'kk': '«Бұл дұрыс емес себебі мен дұрыс емес»: Open-Ended VQA тапсырмаларын жасау және бағалау үшін жеткізу', 'lt': '„Tik todėl, kad esate teisus, nereiškia, kad a š klystu“: užkirsti kelią kliūtims plėtojant ir vertinant atvirą VQA užduotis', 'mk': '„Само затоа што сте во право, не значи дека грешам“: надминувањето на пречката во развојот и евалуацијата на отворени VQA задачи', 'ms': "'Hanya kerana and a betul, tidak bermakna saya salah': Meninggalkan pengembangan dan penilaian tugas VQA Berakhir terbuka", 'mt': '“Minħabba li għandek dritt, ma jfissirx li għandi żball”: Li ngħeleb ostaklu fl-iżvilupp u l-evalwazzjoni t a’ kompiti ta’ VQA miftuħa', 'ml': "'നിങ്ങള്\u200d ശരിയാണെന്നത് കൊണ്ട് മാത്രമേ എനിക്ക് തെറ്റാണെന്ന് ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നുള്ളൂ: ഒരു ബോട്ട്ലെന്\u200dക് വികസിക്കുന്നതില", 'mn': '"Чи зөвхөн зөв болохоор би буруу гэсэн үг биш" гэсэн үг.', 'no': '« Bare fordi du er rett, betyr ikkje a t eg er feil »: Overkommer ein feil i utviklinga og evaluering av open-ended VQA-oppgåver', 'ro': '"Doar pentru că ai dreptate, nu înseamnă că mă înșel": Depășirea unui blocaj în dezvoltarea și evaluarea sarcinilor VQA Open-Ended', 'pl': '"Tylko dlatego, że masz rację, nie znaczy, że się mylę": Przezwyciężenie wąskiego gardła w tworzeniu i ocenie zadań Open-End VQA', 'sr': '„Samo zato što si u pravu, ne znači da sam pogrešio: „Prekidanje vrata u razvoju i procjenu zadataka otvorenog VQA-a', 'si': '`ඔයා හරි කියලා, මම වැරැද්ද කියලා කියන්නේ නැහැ: ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියේ බොට්ලන්ගෙන් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය සහ අවශ්\u200dයාත්මක විදිහට ප්\u200d', 'so': "`Sababta aad saxday darteed ma jeedo inaan khalad ahay': waxaan soo gaadhayaa baaskiil horumarinta iyo qiimeynta shaqaalaha furan ee VQA", 'ta': "'நீங்கள் சரியாக இருக்கிறீர்கள் என்பதால், நான் தவறு என்று அர்த்தம் இல்லை: உருவாக்கத்தில் ஒரு பாட்டின் மேல் வருவது மற்றும் திறந்த வி", 'sv': '"Bara för att du har rätt betyder det inte att jag har fel": Att övervinna en flaskhals i utveckling och utvärdering av Open-Ended VQA-uppgifter', 'ur': '‘صرف اس لئے کہ آپ درست ہیں، یہ منظور نہیں ہے کہ میں غلط ہوں:’ اپنا اپنا اپنا کام کھولنے اور ارزیابی کے ذریعے ایک بٹلگرد پر غالب رہا ہے،', 'vi': "'Chỉ bởi vì anh đúng, không có nghĩa là t ôi sai': Vượt qua một tắc nghẽn trong việc phát triển và đánh giá các nhiệm vụ VHA có hạn", 'uz': "'Chunki siz haqiqatga egangiz sababli, mening xato emas' meni emas: tuzuvchi va ochilgan VQA vazifalarini qiymatga qarang", 'bg': '"Само защото си прав, не означава, че греша": преодоляване на пречката в разработването и оценката на задачите с отворен край', 'hr': '„Samo zato što si u pravu, ne znači da sam pogrešio: „Prelaziti vrat u razvoju i procjenu zadataka otvorenog VQA-a', 'da': "'Bare fordi du har ret, betyder det ikke, at jeg tager fejl': Overvinde flaskehalse i udvikling og evaluering af Open-Ended VQA opgaver", 'nl': "'Alleen omdat je gelijk hebt, betekent niet dat ik het mis heb': Een knelpunt overwinnen in ontwikkeling en evaluatie van Open-End VQA taken", 'de': '"Nur weil du Recht hast, heißt das nicht, dass ich falsch liege": Engpässe bei der Entwicklung und Bewertung von Open-End-VQA-Aufgaben überwinden', 'id': "'Hanya karena Anda benar, tidak berarti saya salah': mengatasi sebuah keterangan dalam pengembangan dan evaluasi tugas VQA berakhir terbuka", 'ko': '`단지 네가 옳기 때문에 내가 틀렸다는 것은 아니다. 개방식 VQA 임무를 개발하고 평가하는 병목을 극복하는 것이다.', 'fa': '«فقط به خاطر اینکه حق با توئه، معنیش این نیست که من اشتباه می\u200cکنم»: تغییر دادن یک گردن بطری در توسعه و ارزیابی کارهای VQA باز پایان', 'sw': "'Kwa sababu tu uko sahihi, haimaanishi kuwa ninakosa': Kupitia mabomu katika maendeleo na kutathmini kazi za VQA zilizomalizika huru", 'af': '"Net omdat jy reg is, beteken dit nie dat ek verkeerd is nie: oorweeg \'n botnek in ontwikkeling en evaluering van Open-Ended VQA-opdragte', 'tr': 'Diňe dogry bolsaňyz üçin, meniň ýalňyşymy diýjek däldir: Açyk-Açyk VQA zadynyň çykyşynyň üstünde boýunçylygyny we deňlemegini iňleýär', 'sq': '"Vetëm sepse ke t ë drejtë, nuk do të thotë se jam gabim": kapërcimi i një pengese në zhvillimin dhe vlerësimin e detyrave të VQA me fund të hapur', 'am': "'እውነት ስለ ሆንህ ስህተት ስህተት አይደለም'፤ የክፈት VQA ስራዎችን በማድረግ እና ማረጋገጫ ላይ", 'hy': '«Պարզապես այն պատճառով, որ դու ճիշտ ես, չի նշանակում, որ ես սխալ եմ»: Բաց-ավարտված VQA-ի առաջադրանքների զարգացման և գնահատման մի խոչընդոտ հաղթահարելը', 'az': '"Doğru olduğunuz üçün, mən yanlış deyiləm" deyildir.', 'bn': "'শুধু তুমি ঠিক বলেছ, তার মানে আমি ভুল করি না: উন্নয়নে একটি বোটলেঙ্ক পাওয়া যাচ্ছি এবং উন্মুক্ত ভিকিওএ কাজের মূল্যায়ন", 'bs': '„Samo zato što si u pravu, ne znači da sam u krivu: „Prevladavanje vrata u razvoju i procjenu zadataka otvorenog VQA-a', 'ca': '"Només perquè tens raó, no vol dir que estigui equivocat": superar un bloc d\'ampolla en el desenvolupament i l\'evaluació de tasques de VQA obertes', 'cs': '"Jen proto, že máte pravdu, neznamená, že se mýlím": Překonání úzkého místa ve vývoji a hodnocení otevřených úkolů VQA', 'fi': '"Vaikka olet oikeassa, ei se tarkoita, että olisin väärässä": Pullonkaulan voittaminen avoimien VQA-tehtävien kehittämisessä ja arvioinnissa', 'et': '"See, et sul on õigus, ei tähenda, et ma eksin": kitsaskohast ületamine avatud VQA ülesannete arendamisel ja hindamisel', 'jv': '` Mangkin nganggep sampeyan wis lunga, lak ketahane aku ora tak wae: nggawe barang bote kanggo kebebasan lan jewulanan Open-Ended VqA tasks', 'he': '"רק בגלל שאתה צודק, זה לא אומר שאני טועה": להתגבר על בקבוק בפיתוח והעריכה של משימות VQA בסוף פתוח', 'ha': "`Jin da tu da gaske ne, ba za ka faɗa misalin a': An sami wani littãfi a cikin shirin da aka buɗe da kuma an ƙaddara aikin da aka cika", 'sk': '"Samo zato, ker imaš prav, še ne pomeni, da se motim": Premaganje ozkih grl pri razvoju in ocenjevanju odprtih nalog VQA', 'bo': '` དེའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི་ཁྱོད་ཀྱིས་ཐད་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་དེ་ང་ནོར་སྐྱོན་མེད་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་།'}
{'en': 'GQA (CITATION) is a dataset for real-world visual reasoning and compositional question answering. We found that many answers predicted by the best vision-language models on the GQA dataset do not match the ground-truth answer but still are semantically meaningful and correct in the given context. In fact, this is the case with most existing visual question answering (VQA) datasets where they assume only one ground-truth answer for each question. We propose Alternative Answer Sets (AAS) of ground-truth answers to address this limitation, which is created automatically using off-the-shelf NLP tools. We introduce a semantic metric based on AAS and modify top VQA solvers to support multiple plausible answers for a question. We implement this approach on the GQA dataset and show the performance improvements.', 'fr': "GQA (CITATION) est un ensemble de données pour le raisonnement visuel réel et la réponse aux questions compositionnelles. Nous avons constaté que de nombreuses réponses prédites par les meilleurs modèles de langage visuel sur le jeu de données GQA ne correspondent pas à la réponse de la vérité de terrain, mais sont toujours sémantiquement significatives et correctes dans le contexte donné. En fait, c'est le cas de la plupart des ensembles de données de réponse visuelle aux questions (VQA) existants où ils supposent une seule réponse de vérité de terrain pour chaque question. Nous proposons des ensembles de réponses alternatifs (SAA) de réponses de vérité terrain pour répondre à cette limitation, qui sont créés automatiquement à l'aide d'outils de PNL standard. Nous introduisons une métrique sémantique basée sur AAS et modifions les meilleurs solveurs VQA pour prendre en charge plusieurs réponses plausibles pour une question. Nous mettons en œuvre cette approche sur le jeu de données GQA et montrons les améliorations de performances.", 'pt': 'GQA (CITATION) é um conjunto de dados para raciocínio visual do mundo real e resposta a perguntas de composição. Descobrimos que muitas respostas previstas pelos melhores modelos de linguagem de visão no conjunto de dados GQA não correspondem à resposta de verdade, mas ainda são semanticamente significativas e corretas no contexto fornecido. Na verdade, esse é o caso da maioria dos conjuntos de dados de resposta visual a perguntas (VQA) existentes, em que eles assumem apenas uma resposta verdadeira para cada pergunta. Propomos Conjuntos de Respostas Alternativas (AAS) de respostas verdadeiras para resolver essa limitação, que é criada automaticamente usando ferramentas de PNL prontas para uso. Introduzimos uma métrica semântica baseada em AAS e modificamos os principais solucionadores de VQA para oferecer suporte a várias respostas plausíveis para uma pergunta. Implementamos essa abordagem no conjunto de dados GQA e mostramos as melhorias de desempenho.', 'ar': 'GQA (CITATION) عبارة عن مجموعة بيانات للتفكير البصري الواقعي والإجابة على الأسئلة التركيبية. لقد وجدنا أن العديد من الإجابات التي تنبأ بها أفضل نماذج لغة الرؤية في مجموعة بيانات GQA لا تتطابق مع إجابة الحقيقة الأساسية ولكنها لا تزال ذات مغزى وصحيحة في السياق المحدد. في الواقع ، هذا هو الحال مع معظم مجموعات البيانات الحالية للإجابة على الأسئلة المرئية (VQA) حيث تفترض إجابة واحدة فقط لكل سؤال. نقترح مجموعات الإجابات البديلة (AAS) لإجابات الحقيقة الواقعية لمعالجة هذا القيد ، والذي يتم إنشاؤه تلقائيًا باستخدام أدوات معالجة اللغات الطبيعية الجاهزة. نقدم مقياسًا دلاليًا يعتمد على AAS ونقوم بتعديل أفضل أدوات حل VQA لدعم إجابات متعددة معقولة لسؤال ما. ننفذ هذا النهج على مجموعة بيانات GQA ونعرض تحسينات الأداء.', 'es': 'GQA (CITATION) es un conjunto de datos para el razonamiento visual del mundo real y la respuesta a preguntas compositivas. Descubrimos que muchas respuestas predichas por los mejores modelos de lenguaje de visión en el conjunto de datos de GQA no coinciden con la respuesta de la verdad fundamental, pero siguen siendo semánticamente significativas y correctas en el contexto dado. De hecho, este es el caso de la mayoría de los conjuntos de datos de respuesta visual a preguntas (VQA) existentes, en los que suponen solo una respuesta real para cada pregunta. Proponemos conjuntos de respuestas alternativas (AAS) de respuestas reales para abordar esta limitación, que se crea automáticamente utilizando herramientas de PNL estándar. Introducimos una métrica semántica basada en AAS y modificamos los principales solucionadores de VQA para que admitan múltiples respuestas plausibles a una pregunta. Implementamos este enfoque en el conjunto de datos de GQA y mostramos las mejoras de rendimiento.', 'ja': 'GQA （引用）は、現実世界の視覚的推論と構成的質問の回答のためのデータセットです。GQAデータセット上の最良のビジョン言語モデルによって予測される多くの回答は、地上真実の回答と一致しないが、与えられた文脈では意味的に有意義で正しいことがわかりました。実際、これは、ほとんどの既存の視覚的質問回答（ VQA ）データセットの場合であり、質問ごとに1つの真実の回答のみを想定しています。この制限に対処するための代替回答セット（ AAS ）を提案します。これは、既製のNLPツールを使用して自動的に作成されます。AASに基づいたセマンティックメトリックを導入し、質問に対する複数の妥当な回答をサポートするためにトップVQAソルバーを修正します。このアプローチをGQAデータセットに実装し、パフォーマンスの向上を示します。', 'zh': 'GQA(引文)者真实世界理数集也。 GQA数集上至视言语,众对不侔,而给定上下文犹有语义义正确性。 多见视问(VQA)数集都如此,假设一本。 臣等立地实答案者代答案集(AAS)以决其限,此用现成之NLP具自创也。 引入一AAS之语义指标,改顶级VQA求解器,以赞数理。 吾于 GQA 数集上成此术,而示性改进。', 'hi': 'GQA (CITATION) वास्तविक दुनिया के दृश्य तर्क और रचनात्मक प्रश्न का उत्तर देने के लिए एक डेटासेट है। हमने पाया कि जीक्यूए डेटासेट पर सबसे अच्छे दृष्टि-भाषा मॉडल द्वारा भविष्यवाणी किए गए कई उत्तर जमीनी-सत्य उत्तर से मेल नहीं खाते हैं, लेकिन फिर भी दिए गए संदर्भ में शब्दार्थ रूप से सार्थक और सही हैं। वास्तव में, यह अधिकांश मौजूदा दृश्य प्रश्न उत्तर (वीक्यूए) डेटासेट के साथ मामला है जहां वे प्रत्येक प्रश्न के लिए केवल एक जमीनी-सत्य उत्तर मानते हैं। हम इस सीमा को संबोधित करने के लिए ग्राउंड-ट्रुथ उत्तरों के वैकल्पिक उत्तर सेट (एएएस) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो स्वचालित रूप से ऑफ-द-शेल्फ एनएलपी उपकरणों का उपयोग करके बनाया जाता है। हम एएएस के आधार पर एक शब्दार्थ मीट्रिक पेश करते हैं और एक प्रश्न के लिए कई प्रशंसनीय उत्तरों का समर्थन करने के लिए शीर्ष वीक्यूए सॉल्वर को संशोधित करते हैं। हम GQA डेटासेट पर इस दृष्टिकोण को लागू करते हैं और प्रदर्शन सुधार दिखाते हैं।', 'ru': 'GQA (CITATION) - это набор данных для визуального мышления в реальном мире и ответов на композиционные вопросы. Мы обнаружили, что многие ответы, предсказанные лучшими моделями языка видения на наборе данных GQA, не соответствуют ответу «земля-правда», но все еще семантически значимы и правильны в данном контексте. Фактически, это относится к большинству существующих наборов данных для визуального ответа на вопрос (VQA), где они предполагают только один ответ на каждый вопрос. Для устранения этого ограничения мы предлагаем альтернативные наборы ответов (AAS), которые создаются автоматически с использованием готовых инструментов NLP. Мы вводим семантическую метрику на основе AAS и модифицируем лучшие решатели VQA для поддержки нескольких правдоподобных ответов на вопрос. Мы реализуем этот подход на наборе данных GQA и показываем улучшения производительности.', 'ga': 'Is tacar sonraí é GQA (CITATION) le haghaidh réasúnaíocht amhairc agus freagraí ar cheisteanna cumadóireachta. Fuaireamar amach nach bhfuil go leor freagraí atá tuartha ag na múnlaí físteanga is fearr ar thacar sonraí GQA ag teacht leis an bhfreagra ar an bhfírinne talún ach go bhfuil brí shéimeantach leo agus go bhfuil siad ceart sa chomhthéacs ar leith. Déanta na fírinne, is é seo an cás leis an gcuid is mó de na tacair sonraí físfhreagartha (VQA) atá ann cheana féin nuair nach nglacann siad ach le freagra fíorfhírinne amháin do gach ceist. Molaimid Sraitheanna Freagraí Malartacha (AAS) de fhreagraí fhírinneachta chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an teorannú seo, a chruthaítear go huathoibríoch ag baint úsáide as uirlisí NLP as an tseilf. Tugaimid isteach méadrach shéimeantach bunaithe ar AAS agus modhnaimid sár-réiteoirí VQA chun tacú le freagraí sochreidte iolracha ar cheist. Cuirimid an cur chuige seo i bhfeidhm ar thacar sonraí GQA agus taispeánann muid na feabhsuithe feidhmíochta.', 'ka': 'GQA (CITATION) არის რეალური მსოფლიოს ვიზუალური პარამენტის და კომპოციონალური კითხვის პასუხისთვის მონაცემები. ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ ბევრი პასუხი, რომლებიც GQA მონაცემების საუკეთესო სიტყვების მოდელეებიდან წინასწარმოდგინენ, მაგრამ უკეთესოდ სენმანტიკურად მნიშვნელოვანი და მა სინამდვილეში, ეს არის ყველაზე მხოლოდ ვიზუალური კითხვების გასაღები (VQA) მონაცემების შესახებ, სადაც ისინი ყველა კითხვისთვის მხოლოდ ერთი მხოლოდ მხოლოდ ერთ ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ გადაწყვეტის ალტერნატური პასუხი (AAS) მხოლოდ სიმართლის პასუხების შესახებ, რომელიც ავტომატურად შექმნილია NLP ხელსაწყობილობის გამოყენებით. ჩვენ ვაჩვენებთ სემონტიკური მეტრიკი AAS-ზე დაბაზეული და შეცვალოთ VQA პროცემები, რაც უფრო დარწმუნებელია კითხვისთვის მრავალი შესახებ. ჩვენ ეს პროგრამა GQA მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში გამოყენებთ და გამოჩვენებთ კონფიგურაციას.', 'hu': 'A GQA (CITATION) egy adatkészlet a valós vizuális érveléshez és kompozíciós kérdések megválaszolásához. Megállapítottuk, hogy a GQA adatkészleten található legjobb látónyelvi modellek által előrejelzett sok válasz nem egyezik meg az alap-igazság válaszával, de még mindig szemantikailag jelentős és helyes az adott kontextusban. Valójában ez a helyzet a legtöbb meglévő vizuális kérdésre válaszoló (VQA) adatkészletnél, ahol minden kérdésre csak egy alapvető igazságválaszt feltételeznek. Ennek a korlátozásnak a kezelése érdekében alternatív válaszkészleteket (AAS) javasoljuk, amelyek automatikusan létrehozásra kerülnek a polcon kívüli NLP eszközökkel. Bevezetünk egy AAS alapú szemantikai metriát, és módosítjuk a legjobb VQA-megoldókat, hogy támogassuk a több valószínű választ egy kérdésre. Ezt a megközelítést alkalmazzuk a GQA adatkészleten és bemutatjuk a teljesítmény javulását.', 'el': 'Το GQA (CITATION) είναι ένα σύνολο δεδομένων για την πραγματική οπτική συλλογιστική και την απάντηση σύνθετων ερωτήσεων. Διαπιστώσαμε ότι πολλές απαντήσεις που προβλέπονται από τα καλύτερα μοντέλα οπτικής γλώσσας στο σύνολο δεδομένων δεν ταιριάζουν με την απάντηση της βασικής αλήθειας αλλά εξακολουθούν να έχουν σημασιολογική σημασία και ορθότητα στο δεδομένο πλαίσιο. Στην πραγματικότητα, αυτό συμβαίνει με τα περισσότερα υπάρχοντα σύνολα δεδομένων οπτικής απάντησης (VQA) όπου υποθέτουν μόνο μία βασική απάντηση για κάθε ερώτηση. Προτείνουμε εναλλακτικά σύνολα απαντήσεων για την αντιμετώπιση αυτού του περιορισμού, το οποίο δημιουργείται αυτόματα χρησιμοποιώντας τα διαθέσιμα εργαλεία NLP. Εισάγουμε μια σημασιολογική μετρική βασισμένη σε AAS και τροποποιούμε τους κορυφαίους επιλυτές ώστε να υποστηρίζουν πολλαπλές αξιόπιστες απαντήσεις για μια ερώτηση. Εφαρμόζουμε αυτή την προσέγγιση στο σύνολο δεδομένων και παρουσιάζουμε τις βελτιώσεις απόδοσης.', 'it': 'GQA (CITATION) è un set di dati per il ragionamento visivo del mondo reale e la risposta alle domande compositive. Abbiamo scoperto che molte risposte previste dai migliori modelli di linguaggio visivo sul set di dati GQA non corrispondono alla risposta alla verità di base, ma sono ancora semanticamente significative e corrette nel contesto dato. Infatti, questo è il caso della maggior parte dei dataset di risposta visiva alle domande (VQA) esistenti in cui assumono una sola risposta di base per ogni domanda. Proponiamo Alternative Answer Sets (AAS) di risposte basate sulla verità di base per affrontare questa limitazione, che viene creata automaticamente utilizzando strumenti NLP off-the-shelf. Introduciamo una metrica semantica basata su AAS e modifichiamo i migliori risolutori VQA per supportare più risposte plausibili per una domanda. Implementiamo questo approccio sul set di dati GQA e mostriamo i miglioramenti delle prestazioni.', 'mk': 'GQA (CITATION) е набор на податоци за визуелно размислување во реалниот свет и одговор на композициски прашања. Најдовме дека многу одговори предвидени од најдобрите модели на јазик на визија на податоците на GQA не се совпаѓаат со одговорот на земја-вистината, но се сé уште семантично значајни и коректни во дадениот контекст. Всушност, ова е случајот со повеќето постоечки визуелни прашања кои одговараат на (VQA) податоци каде тие претпоставуваат само еден одговор на основна вистина за секое прашање. Предложуваме Алтернативни сети одговори (ААС) на одговори за основна вистина за решавање на овие ограничувања, кои се создаваат автоматски користејќи NLP алатки надвор од полицата. Ние воведуваме семантична метрика базирана на AAS и модификуваме врвни VQA решители за да поддржиме повеќе веројатни одговори за прашање. Го спроведуваме овој пристап на податоците на ГКА и ги покажуваме подобрувањата на резултатите.', 'kk': 'GQA (CITATION) шын әлемдегі визуалдық сезімдер мен композиционалық сұрақтар жауап беру үшін деректер жиыны. Біз GQA деректер жиынындағы ең жақсы көрініс тіл моделдерінің көптеген жауаптарды таптық. Бірақ олардың көптеген жауаптары жергілікті жауапқа сәйкес келмейді, бірақ олар келтірілген контек Шынымен, бұл көп көрінетін сұрақтар (VQA) деректер қорларының жауабы болса, олар әрбір сұрақ үшін тек бір жергілікті жауап береді. Бұл шектеулерді шектеу үшін басқа жауап баптауларын (AAS) таңдаймыз. Бұл NLP шектеулері автоматты түрде орнатылады. Біз AAS негіздеген семантикалық метрикалық мәтірлерді таңдап, бірнеше сенімді жауаптарды қолдау үшін жоғары VQA шешімдерін өзгертеміз. Бұл тәсілді GQA деректер жиынына іске асырып, әрекеттерді жақсарту көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'GQA (CITATION) yra realaus pasaulio vizualinio motyvavimo ir kompozicinių klausimų atsakymo duomenų rinkinys. Nustatėme, kad daugelis atsakymų, numatytų geriausiais GQA duomenų rinkinio vizijų kalbos modeliais, neatitinka antžeminės tiesos atsakymo, bet vis dar yra semantiškai reikšmingi ir teisingi tam tikru kontekstu. Tiesą sakant, taip yra daugelio egzistuojančių vizualinių klausimų (VQA) duomenų rinkinių atveju, kai jie numato tik vieną esminį atsakymą į kiekvieną klausimą. Mes siūlome alternatyvius atsakymų rinkinius (AAS), kuriuose pateikiami antžeminiai atsakymai, kad būtų pašalinti šie apribojimai, kurie yra sukurti automatiškai naudojant NLP priemones. Įdiegiame semantinę AAS pagrįstą metriją ir modifikuojame aukščiausius VQA tirpiklius, kad būtų galima remti kelis patikimus atsakymus į klausimą. Įgyvendinsime šį požiūrį į GQA duomenų rinkinį ir parodysime rezultatų gerinimą.', 'ml': 'ജിക്യൂ (CITATION) യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോകത്തിലെ കാഴ്ചയുള്ള കാരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും കൂടുതല്\u200d ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിനും ഒര ജിക്യൂഎ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റിലെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല ദര്\u200dശന-ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രതീക്ഷിച്ചിട്ടുള്ള മറുപടികള്\u200d ഭൂമിയിലെ സത്യമറുപടിയോട് പൊരുതുന്നില്ല എന്ന യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥത്തില്\u200d, ഇതാണ് നിലവിലുള്ള കാഴ്ച ചോദ്യം (വിക്യൂഎ) ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നത്. ഓരോ ചോദ്യത്തിന ഭൂമിയിലെ സത്യമറുപടികള്\u200d AAS അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഒരു സെമാന്റിക് മെറ്റിക്ക് പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തി ഒരു ചോദ്യം പിന്തുണയ്ക്കാന്\u200d മുകളിലുള്ള വിക്യൂഎ സോള്\u200d ജിക്യൂഎ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d നാം ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു.', 'ms': 'GQA (CITATION) adalah set data untuk pemikiran visual dunia nyata dan jawapan soalan komposisi. Kami mendapati bahawa banyak jawapan yang dijangka oleh model bahasa-penglihatan terbaik pada set data GQA tidak sepadan dengan jawapan kebenaran tanah tetapi masih bermakna secara semantik dan betul dalam konteks yang diberikan. Sebenarnya, ini adalah kes dengan kebanyakan soalan visual yang ada menjawab set data (VQA) di mana mereka menganggap hanya satu jawapan kebenaran tanah untuk setiap soalan. Kami cadangkan Set Jawapan Alternatif (AAS) jawapan-kebenaran tanah untuk mengatasi keterangan ini, yang dicipta secara automatik menggunakan alat NLP off-the-shelf. Kami memperkenalkan metrik semantik berdasarkan AAS dan mengubahsuai penyelesaian VQA atas untuk menyokong beberapa jawapan yang mungkin untuk soalan. Kami melaksanakan pendekatan ini pada set data GQA dan menunjukkan peningkatan prestasi.', 'mt': "Il-GQA (ĊITAZZJONI) hija sett ta’ dejta għar-raġunament viżiv fid-dinja reali u t-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet kompożittivi. Instabna li ħafna tweġibiet imbassra mill-aħjar mudelli tal-lingwa viżiva fis-sett tad-dejta tal-GQA ma jaqblux mat-tweġiba tal-verità tal-art iżda għadhom semantikament sinifikanti u korretti fil-kuntest partikolari. Fil-fatt, dan huwa l-każ għall-biċċa l-kbira tas-settijiet tad-dejta li jwieġbu għall-mistoqsijiet viżivi (VQA) fejn jassumu biss tweġiba waħda tal-verità għal kull mistoqsija. Aħna nipproponu Settijiet Alternattivi ta' Tweġibiet (AAS) ta' tweġibiet tal-verità tal-art biex nindirizzaw din il-limitazzjoni, li tinħoloq awtomatikament bl-użu ta' għodod NLP li ma jaqgħux fuq l-ixkaffa. Aħna nintroduċu metrika semantika bbażata fuq AAS u nimmodifikaw is-solventi tal-ogħla VQA biex nappoġġjaw diversi tweġibiet plawżibbli għal mistoqsija. We implement this approach on the GQA dataset and show the performance improvements.", 'pl': 'GQA (CITATION) to zbiór danych do rzeczywistego rozumowania wizualnego i odpowiedzi na pytania kompozycyjne. Odkryliśmy, że wiele odpowiedzi przewidywanych przez najlepsze modele języka wizji na zbiorze danych GQA nie pasuje do odpowiedzi podstawowej prawdy, ale nadal są znaczące semantycznie i poprawne w danym kontekście. W rzeczywistości jest tak w przypadku większości istniejących zestawów danych wizualnych odpowiedzi na pytania (VQA), gdzie zakładają one tylko jedną odpowiedź podstawową dla każdego pytania. Proponujemy alternatywne zestawy odpowiedzi (AAS) odpowiedzi podstawowych, aby rozwiązać to ograniczenie, które jest tworzone automatycznie za pomocą gotowych narzędzi NLP. Wprowadzamy metrykę semantyczną opartą na AAS i modyfikujemy najlepsze rozwiązania VQA, aby obsługiwać wiele wiarygodnych odpowiedzi na pytanie. Wdrażamy to podejście na zbiorze danych GQA i pokazujemy poprawy wydajności.', 'ro': 'GQA (CITATION) este un set de date pentru raționamentul vizual din lumea reală și răspunsul la întrebări compoziționale. Am descoperit că multe răspunsuri prezise de cele mai bune modele de limbaj vizual din setul de date GQA nu se potrivesc cu răspunsul de bază-adevăr, dar sunt încă semnificative semantic și corecte în contextul dat. De fapt, acesta este cazul majorității seturilor de date vizuale de răspuns la întrebări (VQA) existente, unde presupun un singur răspuns de bază pentru fiecare întrebare. Propunem seturi de răspunsuri alternative (AAS) de răspunsuri de bază adevărate pentru a aborda această limitare, care este creată automat folosind instrumente NLP off-the-shelf. Introducem o metrică semantică bazată pe AAS și modificăm rezolvătorii de top VQA pentru a susține mai multe răspunsuri plauzibile pentru o întrebare. Implementăm această abordare pe setul de date GQA și prezentăm îmbunătățirile performanței.', 'sr': 'GQA (CITATION) je seta podataka za realno-svetsko vizualno razmišljanje i odgovor na kompozicionalno pitanje. Našli smo da mnogi odgovori predviđaju najbolji modeli vizije-jezika na setu podataka GQA ne odgovaraju na odgovor na zemlju-istinu, ali i dalje su semantički smisleni i ispravni u određenom kontekstu. Zapravo, ovo je slučaj sa najpostojećim vizualnim pitanjima odgovarajućim podacima (VQA), gdje pretpostavljaju samo jedan odgovor na temeljno istinu za svako pitanje. Predlažemo alternativnim setima odgovora (AAS) zemaljskih istinskih odgovora na rješavanje ovog ograničenja, koja se stvara automatski korištenjem NLP alata bez police. Predstavljamo semantičku metriku baziranu na AAS-u i modifikujemo vrhunske rešenje VQA-a kako bi podržali višestruke uvjerljive odgovore na pitanje. Mi implementiramo taj pristup na setu podataka GQA i pokažemo poboljšanje učinka.', 'so': "GQA (CITATION) waa macluumaad looga jawaabo su'aalaha muuqashada iyo arrimaha hoose ee dunida. Waxaan ogaanay in jawaabo badan oo lagu soo hormariyey tusaalaha ugu fiican ee muuqashada ee GQA ayan u egin jawaabta runta ee dhulka, laakiin weli waxay ka mid yihiin mid u muhiimsan oo saxda xigta la qoray. Xaqiiqdii, taasi waa xaalad ay ku jawaabi karto su'aalaha aragtida oo ugu badan (VQA) oo ay u malaynayaan jawaabta xaqa ee su'aal kasta. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa jawaabaha u bedelashada (AAS) oo ah jawaabaha runta ah si aan ugu hadlno xuduudkan, kaas oo si gaar ah loo sameeyo qalabka laga isticmaalo qoraalka NLP. Waxaynu soo bandhignaa qaab semantic ah oo AAS ku saleysan oo aan beddelinayno qalabka kore ee VQA si aan u kaalmeyno jawaabo kala duduwan oo su'aal ah. Waxaynu sameynaa qaababkan ku saabsan danbiyada GQA, waxaana tusnaa horumarinta horumarinta sameynta.", 'sv': 'GQA (CITATION) är ett dataset för visuellt resonemang i verkligheten och kompositionsfrågor. Vi fann att många svar som förutspås av de bästa visionsspråksmodellerna på GQA-datauppsättningen inte matchar grundsanningssvaret utan fortfarande är semantiskt meningsfulla och korrekta i det givna sammanhanget. Faktum är att detta är fallet med de flesta befintliga visuella frågeställningsdatauppsättningar (VQA) där de antar endast ett grundläggande svar för varje fråga. Vi föreslår AAS (Alternative Answer Sets) av grundsanningar för att åtgärda denna begränsning, som skapas automatiskt med hjälp av färdiga NLP-verktyg. Vi introducerar en semantisk metrik baserad på AAS och modifierar de bästa VQA-lösningarna för att stödja flera rimliga svar på en fråga. Vi implementerar detta tillvägagångssätt på GQA datauppsättningen och visar prestandaförbättringarna.', 'no': 'GQA (CITATION) er eit datasett for realske verdens visuell rasjon og samordning av spørsmål. Vi fann at mange svar som foregår av dei beste visingsspråk-modelane på GQA-datasettet passar ikkje med bakgrunnsannhetssvaret, men er fortsatt semantisk betydelige og korrekte i den oppgjevne konteksten. Faktisk er dette tilfellet med dei mest eksisterande visuelle spørsmålsettene som svarar (VQA) der dei antar berre ein grunnsannhetssvar for kvar spørsmål. Vi foreslår alternativ svarsetjing (AAS) av grunnsannhetssvar til å adressa denne grensen, som vert laga automatisk med NLP- verktøya frå hjelpeteksten. Vi introduserer ein semantisk metrisk basert på AAS og endrar øvre VQA-løysare for å støtta fleire tilgjengelege svar på eit spørsmål. Vi implementerer denne tilnærminga på GQA-datasettet og viser utviklinga forbetringar.', 'mn': 'GQA (CITATION) бол жинхэнэ дэлхийн үзэл санаа, бүтээлч асуулт хариултын өгөгдлийн санг юм. Бид GQA өгөгдлийн сангийн хамгийн шилдэг үзэл хэл загвараар тодорхойлж байгаа олон хариултууд газрын үнэний хариулттай холбоотой гэхдээ одоо ч үргэлж тодорхойлолтой, зөв байдаг. Үнэндээ, энэ бол хамгийн их харагдах асуулт (VQA) өгөгдлийн сангуудын хариулт юм. Бид энэхүү хязгаарлалтыг удирдах Alternative Answer Sets (AAS) болон NLP хэрэгсэл ашиглан автоматаар бүтээгдэхүүний хариултыг санал болгож байна. Бид AAS-н үндсэн семантик метрийг танилцуулж, дээд нь VQA шийдвэрлэгчийг олон итгэлтэй хариултыг дэмждэг. Бид энэ арга замыг GQA өгөгдлийн сан дээр хийж, үйл ажиллагааны сайжруулалтыг харуулж байна.', 'si': 'GQA (CITATION) තමයි ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ දර්ශණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් උත්තර දෙන්න දත්ත සෙට්. අපි හොයාගත්තා කියලා ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙන්නේ GQA දත්ත සෙට්ටුවේ හොඳම දර්ශනය-භාෂා මොඩේල් වලි ඇත්තටම, මේක තමයි හැම ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්වාස ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාව (VQA) දත්ත සැකසුම් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතර අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර සෙට්ට් (AAS) වෙනස් ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා මේ සීමාව සඳහ අපි AAS සඳහා සෙමැන්ටික් මෙට්\u200dරික් එකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් විශ්වාස කරන්න සඳහා විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහය අපි GQA දත්ත සූදානයේ මේක ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනය ප්\u200dරවේශනය පෙන්වන්න.', 'ta': 'GQA (CITATION) உண்மையான உலக பார்வையான காரணங்களுக்கும் தொகுதி கேள்விக்கும் தகவல் அமைப்பு. GQA தகவல் அமைப்பில் சிறந்த பார்வை - மொழி மாதிரிகளால் எத்தனை பதிலும் பொருந்தவில்லை என்பதை நாம் கண்டுபிடித்தோம் ஆனால் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட சூழல உண்மையில், இது தான் இருக்கும் பார்வை கேள்விக்கு பதில் இருக்கும் தகவல் அமைப்புகளில் ஒவ்வொரு கேள்விக்கும் ஒரு நிலையில நாம் மாற்று பதில் அமைப்புகள் (AAS) நிலத்தில் உண்மையின் பதில்களை நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம். இந்த எல்லைக்கு முகவரிக்க, அது NLP கருவிகளை தானாகவே  AAS அடிப்படையில் ஒரு அரைப்புள்ளி மெட்ரிக் குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் மேல் VQA தீர்வுகளை மாற்றுகிறோம் பல விளையாட்ட ஜிக்யூஏ தரவுத்தளத்தில் இந்த முறையை நாம் செயல்படுத்தி செயல்பாடு முன்னேற்றத்தைக் காட்டு', 'ur': 'GQA (CITATION) حقیقی دنیا کی تصویر و جواب کے لئے ایک ڈیٹ سٹ ہے۔ ہم نے دیکھا کہ بہت سی جواب جو GQA ڈیٹسٹ میں بہترین دیدھی-زبان موڈل کے ذریعہ سے پیش کیا گیا ہے وہ زمین-حقیقی جواب کے مطابق نہیں ہیں لیکن اب تک بھی معلوم اور درست ہیں۔ حقیقت یہ ہے کہ سب سے زیادہ موجود visual سوال کے جواب دینے والی (VQA) ڈیٹ سٹ کے ساتھ، جہاں وہ ہر سوال کے لئے صرف ایک ground-truth جواب سمجھتے ہیں. ہم نے زمین-حقیقت کے جواب کو اس محدودیت کے بارے میں پیغام دینے والی جواب سٹ (AAS) کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے، جو NLP ابزار کے مطابق اپنے ساتھ پیدا کیا جاتا ہے. ہم نے AAS پر بنیاد ایک سیمنٹی میٹریک کو معلوم کریں اور ایک سوال کے لئے بہت سی قابل تحقیقات کی مدد کریں۔ ہم اس طریقہ کو GQA ڈیٹ سٹ پر لازم کریں گے اور عملکرد کی اصلاح کو دکھائیں گے۔', 'vi': 'GQA (độc lập) là một tập tin cho việc lý luận thị giác trên thế giới thực và trả lời câu hỏi liên quan. Chúng tôi tìm thấy rằng nhiều câu trả lời được dự đoán bởi những mô hình ngôn ngữ tầm nhìn tốt nhất trên tập tin GQA không khớp với câu trả lời thực tế trên mặt đất, nhưng vẫn có ý nghĩa theo ngữ cảnh và đúng trong một ngữ cảnh cụ thể. Sự thật, đây là trường hợp của hầu hết các câu hỏi trực tiếp tồn tại (các câu hỏi kiểu VGA) nơi họ nhận ra chỉ một câu trả lời thực tế cho mỗi câu hỏi. Chúng tôi đề xuất các câu trả lời thay thế (AAS) của các câu trả lời Chân Lý Mặt đất để thực hiện giới hạn này, được tự động tạo ra bằng các công cụ NLP. Chúng tôi sẽ giới thiệu một thước đo ngữ pháp dựa trên AAS và sửa đổi chất lượng VHA trên cùng để hỗ trợ nhiều câu trả lời hợp lý cho một câu hỏi. Chúng tôi thực hiện phương pháp này trên tập tin GQA và cho thấy khả năng cải tiến.', 'uz': "Name Biz GQA maʼlumotlar sahifadagi eng yaxshi ko'pchilik koʻrinish modellari bilan ishlatilgan javoblar yuqori javob bermaydi, lekin ammo ular koʻrsatilgan muhit va toʻgʻri mavjud. Aslida, bu holatda mavjud ko'rinadigan savol (VQA) maʼlumotlarning javobi bilan ular har bir savol uchun bitta javob beradi. Bu chegarani boshqarish uchun boshqa javob beruvchi (AAS) soniyalarni talab qilamiz. Bu chegarani avtomatik qoʻllash NLP asboblar yordamida yaratiladi. Biz AAS asosida semantik metrikni ko'pchilik javoblarni qoʻllash uchun yuqori VQA solverslarini o'zgartirish va savol uchun bir nechta playlik javoblarini qoʻllash uchun. Buni GQA maʼlumotlar tarkibini bajaramiz va bajarish bajarishni bajaramiz.", 'da': 'GQA (CITATION) er et datasæt til virkelig visuel ræsonnement og kompositionsspørgsmål besvarelse. Vi fandt ud af, at mange svar, der forudsiges af de bedste visionssprogmodeller på GQA datasættet, ikke matcher grundsandhedens svar, men stadig er semantisk meningsfulde og korrekte i den givne kontekst. Faktisk er dette tilfældet med de fleste eksisterende visuelle spørgsmål besvarelse (VQA) datasæt, hvor de antager kun ét grundsandhedsbesvar for hvert spørgsmål. Vi foreslår Alternative Answer Sets (AAS) af grundlæggende svar for at løse denne begrænsning, som oprettes automatisk ved hjælp af off-the-shelf NLP værktøjer. Vi introducerer en semantisk metric baseret på AAS og ændrer top VQA-løsere for at understøtte flere sandsynlige svar på et spørgsmål. Vi implementerer denne tilgang på GQA datasættet og viser ydelsesforbedringerne.', 'nl': 'GQA (CITATION) is een dataset voor real-world visueel redeneren en compositionele vragen beantwoorden. We ontdekten dat veel antwoorden voorspeld door de beste vision-language modellen op de GQA dataset niet overeenkomen met het ground-truth antwoord, maar nog steeds semantisch betekenisvol en correct zijn in de gegeven context. In feite is dit het geval met de meeste bestaande Visual Question Responsing (VQA) datasets waarbij ze slechts één basis-waarheidsantwoord voor elke vraag aannemen. We stellen Alternatieve Answer Sets (AAS) van ground-truth antwoorden voor om deze beperking aan te pakken, die automatisch wordt gemaakt met standaard NLP tools. We introduceren een semantische metric gebaseerd op AAS en modificeren top VQA solvers om meerdere plausibele antwoorden op een vraag te ondersteunen. We implementeren deze aanpak op de GQA dataset en tonen de prestatieverbeteringen.', 'bg': 'ГКА (ЦИТАЦИЯ) е набор от данни за визуално разсъждение в реалния свят и композиционно отговаряне на въпроси. Установихме, че много отговори, прогнозирани от най-добрите модели на визуален език в набора от данни не съвпадат с отговора на основната истина, но все пак са семантично значими и коректни в дадения контекст. Всъщност, това е случаят с повечето съществуващи набори от данни за визуално отговаряне на въпроси (VQA), където те приемат само един основен отговор на истината за всеки въпрос. Предлагаме алтернативни набор от отговори (ААС) от реални отговори за справяне с това ограничение, което се създава автоматично с използване на готови инструменти за НЛП. Въвеждаме семантична метрика, базирана на ААС и модифицираме най-добрите разрешители за поддръжка на множество правдоподобни отговори на въпрос. Ние прилагаме този подход върху набора от данни и показваме подобренията в ефективността.', 'hr': 'GQA (CITATION) je seta podataka za realno-svetsko vizualno razmišljanje i odgovor na pitanje kompozicionalnog pitanja. Našli smo da mnogi odgovori predviđeni najboljim modelima vizije-jezika na podacima GQA ne odgovaraju odgovoru na temeljnu istinu, ali i dalje su semantički značajni i ispravni u određenom kontekstu. Zapravo, to je slučaj sa najpostojećim vizualnim pitanjima odgovarajućim podacima (VQA), gdje pretpostavljaju samo jedan odgovor na temelju istine za svako pitanje. Mi predlažemo alternativne odgovorne sete (AAS) zemaljske istine odgovora na rješavanje ovog ograničenja, što se automatski stvori koristeći NLP alata izvan police. Predstavljamo semantičku metriku na temelju AAS-a i modificiramo vrhunske rješavače VQA-a kako bi podržali višestruke uvjerljive odgovore na pitanje. Mi provedemo taj pristup na setu podataka GQA i pokažemo poboljšanje učinka.', 'de': 'GQA (CITATION) ist ein Datensatz für visuelles Denken und kompositorische Fragen. Wir fanden heraus, dass viele Antworten, die von den besten Vision-Language-Modellen auf dem GQA-Datensatz vorhergesagt wurden, nicht mit der Ground-Truth-Antwort übereinstimmen, aber immer noch semantisch sinnvoll und korrekt im gegebenen Kontext sind. Tatsächlich ist dies bei den meisten bestehenden Visual Question Responsing (VQA)-Datensätzen der Fall, bei denen sie nur eine Ground-Truth-Antwort für jede Frage annehmen. Wir schlagen alternative Answer Sets (AAS) von Ground-Truth-Antworten vor, um diese Einschränkung zu beheben, die automatisch mit standardmäßigen NLP-Tools erstellt wird. Wir führen eine semantische Metrik basierend auf AAS ein und modifizieren Top-VQA-Löser, um mehrere plausible Antworten auf eine Frage zu unterstützen. Wir implementieren diesen Ansatz auf dem GQA-Datensatz und zeigen die Leistungsverbesserungen auf.', 'id': 'GQA (CITATION) is a dataset for real-world visual reasoning and compositional question answering.  We found that many answers predicted by the best vision-language models on the GQA dataset do not match the ground-truth answer but still are semantically meaningful and correct in the given context.  Sebenarnya, ini adalah kasus dengan kebanyakan pertanyaan visual yang ada menjawab dataset (VQA) di mana mereka menganggap hanya satu jawaban dasar-kebenaran untuk setiap pertanyaan. Kami mengusulkan Set Jawaban Alternatif (AAS) dari jawaban kebenaran tanah untuk mengatasi batasan ini, yang dibuat secara otomatis menggunakan alat NLP off-the-shelf. Kami memperkenalkan metrik semantis berdasarkan AAS dan mengubah penyelesaian VQA terbaik untuk mendukung beberapa jawaban yang mungkin untuk pertanyaan. Kami menerapkan pendekatan ini pada set data GQA dan menunjukkan peningkatan prestasi.', 'ko': 'GQA(인용문)는 실제 세계의 시각적 추리와 질문에 대한 답변을 합성하는 데 사용되는 데이터 세트다.우리는 GQA 데이터 집합에서 가장 좋은 시각적 언어 모델이 예측한 많은 답안이 기본적인 사실 답안과 일치하지 않지만 주어진 상하문에서 의미와 정확성을 가진다는 것을 발견했다.사실상 대부분의 기존 시각화 문답(VQA) 데이터 집합은 이렇다. 그들은 모든 문제에 기본적인 사실 답안이 하나밖에 없다고 가정한다.우리는 이 제한을 해결하기 위해 지상 진실 답안의 대체 답안집 (AAS) 을 제시했다. 이것은 기존의 NLP 도구를 사용하여 자동으로 만들어진 것이다.우리는 AAS 기반의 의미 도량을 도입하고 한 문제의 여러 합리적인 답안을 지원하기 위해 최고급 VQA 해산기를 수정했다.GQA 데이터 세트에서 이러한 접근 방식을 구현하고 성능 향상을 보여줍니다.', 'fa': 'GQA (CITATION) یک مجموعه اطلاعات برای دلیل\u200cهای دیده\u200cای و جواب سوال\u200cهای ترکیب جهان واقعی است. ما فهمیدیم که پاسخهای زیادی که توسط بهترین مدل\u200cهای دید و زبان\u200cهای دید در مجموعه داده\u200cهای GQA پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکنند با پاسخ\u200cهای حقیقت زمینی مشابه نمی\u200cکنند، ولی هنوز در محیط\u200cهای معنی و معنی\u200cای است. در حقیقت، این پرونده با پاسخ داده های تصویر (VQA) بیشترین سوال\u200cهای تصویر موجود است که تنها یک جواب حقیقت زمینی برای هر سوال می\u200cگیرند. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم پاسخ\u200cهای جایگزینی (AAS) از پاسخ\u200cهای حقیقت زمینی برای دریافت این محدودیت، که با استفاده از ابزارهای NLP خارج از پناهگاه\u200cها به طور خودکار ایجاد می\u200cشود. ما یک متریک semantic را بر اساس AAS معرفی می کنیم و تغییر کنندگان بالای VQA را برای پشتیبانی از جواب های قابل اعتماد برای یک سوال تغییر می دهیم. ما این روش را روی مجموعه داده\u200cهای GQA انجام می\u200cدهیم و بهترین عملکرد را نشان می\u200cدهیم.', 'sw': 'GQA (CITATION) ni seti ya taarifa kwa sababu inayoonekana duniani yenye mwangalizi na jibu la swali la pamoja. Tumegundua kuwa majibu mengi yaliyotabiriwa na mifano bora ya maono ya lugha kwenye seti ya data ya GQA hayajalinganisha jibu la ukweli wa ardhi lakini bado ni yenye maana na sahihi katika muktadha ulio pewa. Kwa hakika, hili ndilo suala lililopo likijibu maswali ya kuona zaidi (VQA) data ambapo wanadhani jibu la ukweli moja tu kwa kila swali. Tunapendekeza majibu mbadala (AAS) ya majibu ya ukweli wa ardhi kuhusiana na mipaka hii, ambayo inatengenezwa kwa wenyewe kwa kutumia vifaa vya NLP. Tunaonyesha mbinu ya sekondari inayotumika na AAS na kubadilisha suluhisho la juu za VQA ili kuunga mkono majibu kadhaa yanayoweza kutumika kwa swali. Tunatumia mbinu hii kwenye seti ya takwimu za GQA na kuonyesha maendeleo ya utendaji.', 'tr': "GQA (KITATION) reýl-dünýä görsel razylyk we sampli soraglaryň jogapy üçin bir datasetidir. GQA veri setirinde iñ gowy görnüş-dil nusgalaryň öňünden gelen kän jogablar ýeri-dogry jogaba uymaýar ýöne hala hem muny berilen kontekstde hem möhüm we dogry. Aslynda bu ýagdaý bar görnüş soraglaryň (VQA) berüjileriniň köp sahypasy bar, her soragy üçin diňe ýerli-dogry bir jogaby kabul edip bilýän ýerde. Biz ýerlik dogrylygy üçin Alternativ jogabat setirlerini (AAS) şu çykyşy üçin jogabatlaryny teklip edip görýäris. Bu NLP esbaplaryny otomatik bilen ullanýar. AAS'a dayanan semantik metrik çözümlerini tanıtıyoruz ve sorag için birçok mantıklı cevap desteklemek için üst üst VQA çözümlerini değiştirdik. Biz bu metoýy GQA veri setirinde ýüze çykarýarys we etkinlik gelişmelerini görkez.", 'sq': 'GQA (CITATION) është një set të dhënash për arsyetimin vizual të botës reale dhe përgjigjen e pyetjeve kompozitive. Ne gjetëm se shumë përgjigje të parashikuara nga modelet më të mira të gjuhës-vizion në grupin e të dhënave GQA nuk përputhen me përgjigjen tokë-të vërtetë por ende janë semantikisht të kuptueshme dhe të sakta në kontekstin e caktuar. In fact, this is the case with most existing visual question answering (VQA) datasets where they assume only one ground-truth answer for each question.  Ne propozojmë Set Alternative Answers (AAS) të përgjigjeve tokësore-të vërtetës për të trajtuar këtë kufizim, i cili krijohet automatikisht duke përdorur mjete NLP jashtë raftit. Ne prezantojmë një metrikë semantike bazuar në AAS dhe modifikojmë zgjidhësit më të lartë të VQA për të mbështetur përgjigje të shumta të besueshme për një pyetje. Ne zbatojmë këtë qasje në grupin e të dhënave të GQA dhe tregojmë përmirësimet e performancës.', 'am': 'GQA የGQA ዳታ-setን በመልካም የራእይ-ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች ብዙዎች የመሬት-የእውነት መልስ እንዳይተካክሉ አግኝተናል ነገር ግን በተሰጠው ክፍል ተቃውሞ የሚያስፈልገውና የሚያስተካክሉ ናቸው፡፡ በእውነት ይህ ጉዳይ ነው፣ ለሁሉም ጥያቄ አንድ የመሬት እውነተኛ መልስ ብቻ ነው የሚለው የዓይነቱ ጠያቂው መልስ (VQA) ዳታ ሰብስቶች ነው፡፡ የመሬት-የእውነት መልስ ለመጠቀም ለሌሎችን መልስ (AAS) እናሳልጋለን፡፡ ይህንን ግንኙነት ለራሱ የተፈጠረ የNLP መሣሪያዎች ማቀናቀል፡፡ በAAS ላይ የተመሠረተውን የsemantic ሜትሪክ እናሳውቃለን እና ለጥያቄ ብዙዎችን የስልጣዊ መልስ ለመደገፍ እናለውጣለን፡፡ We implement this approach on the GQA dataset and show the performance improvements.', 'af': "GQA (KYTATION) is 'n datastel vir reël- wêreld visuele redering en komposisieele vraag antwoord. Ons het gevind dat baie antwoorde voorskou deur die beste visie-taal modele op die GQA datastel nie ooreenstem die grond-waarheid antwoord nie, maar nog is semantiese betekening en korrek in die gegewe konteks. In werklikheid, hierdie is die geval met mees bestaande visuele vraag antwoord (VQA) datastelle waar hulle net een grond- waarheid antwoord vir elke vraag aanvaar. Ons voorstel Alternatiewe Antwoord Instellings (AAS) van grond- waarheid antwoord na adres hierdie beperking, wat is automaties geskep deur af- die- shelf NLP nutsprogramme te gebruik. Ons introduseer 'n semantiese metriek gebaseer op AAS en verander bo VQA oplosser om veelvuldige plaasbare antwoordes vir 'n vraag te ondersteun. Ons implementeer hierdie toegang op die GQA datastel en wys die prestasie verbeteringe.", 'hy': 'GQA (CITItion) իրական աշխարհի տեսողական մտածողության և համադրական հարցերի պատասխանի տվյալների համակարգ է: Մենք հայտնաբերեցինք, որ GQA տվյալների համակարգի լավագույն տեսողական լեզվի մոդելներով կանխատեսված բազմաթիվ պատասխաններ չեն համապատասխանում հիմնական ճշմարտության պատասխանին, բայց դեռևս սեմանտիկապես իմաստալից են և ճշմարտություն են տվյալ կո Իրականում, սա տեղի է ունենում գոյություն ունեցող տեսողական հարցերին պատասխանելու (VQA) տվյալների համակարգերի դեպքում, որտեղ նրանք ենթադրում են յուրաքանչյուր հարցի համար միայն մեկ հիմնական ճշմարտություն պատասխան: Մենք առաջարկում ենք երկրային ճշմարտության պատասխանների այլընտրանքային համակարգեր (AAS) այս սահմանափակումների լուծման համար, որը ինքնաբերաբար ստեղծվում է օգտագործելով անկողմնակի ՆԼՊ գործիքներ: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք սեմանտիկ մետրիկ AAS-ի վրա և փոփոխում ենք լավագույն VQA լուծողները, որպեսզի աջակցենք հարցի բազմաթիվ հավատալի պատասխաններ: Մենք կիրառում ենք այս մոտեցումը GQA տվյալների համակարգի վրա և ցույց ենք տալիս արդյունավետության բարելավումը:', 'bn': 'জিকিয়া (সিটাটিশন) আসল বিশ্বের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি কারণ এবং সংগঠন প্রশ্নের উত্তরের জন্য একটি ডাটাসেট। আমরা পেয়েছি যে জিকিউএ ডাটাসেটের সর্বোচ্চ ভিশন-ভাষার মডেল দ্বারা ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী অনেক উত্তরের সাথে মিলে যায় না, কিন্তু এখনো প্রদত্ত প্রাপ বাস্তবতা হচ্ছে, বিদ্যমান দৃশ্যমান প্রশ্নের উত্তর (ভিকিউএ) ডাটাসেটের প্রতিটি প্রশ্নের জন্য একটি ভূমি সত্য উত্তর দেয়া হচ্ছে। আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি ভূমি সত্যের উত্তর এই সীমাবদ্ধ করার জন্য, যা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে এনএলপি টুল ব্যবহার করে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে তৈরি করা হয়েছে। আমরা AAS ভিত্তিক একটি সেমেন্টিক মেট্রিক পরিচয় করিয়ে একটি প্রশ্নের জন্য বেশ কয়েকটি প্লায়াসিবাল উত্তর সমর্থন করি। আমরা জিকিউএ ডাটাসেটের ব্যাপারে এই পদক্ষেপ বাস্তবায়িত করি এবং কার্যক্রমের উন্নতি প্রদর্শন করি।', 'bs': 'GQA (CITATION) je seta podataka za realno-svetsko vizualno razmišljanje i odgovor na pitanje kompozicionalnog pitanja. Našli smo da mnogi odgovori predviđaju najbolji modeli vizije-jezika na setu podataka GQA ne odgovaraju odgovoru na temeljnu istinu, ali i dalje su semantički smisleni i ispravni u određenom kontekstu. Zapravo, to je slučaj sa najpostojećim vizualnim pitanjima odgovarajućim podacima (VQA), gdje pretpostavljaju samo jedan odgovor na temeljnu istinu za svako pitanje. Predlažemo alternativnim setima odgovora (AAS) zemaljskih istinskih odgovora na rješavanje ovog ograničenja, koji se automatski stvori koristeći NLP alata izvan police. Predstavljamo semantičku metriku baziranu na AAS-u i modificiramo vrhunske rješavače VQA-a kako bi podržali višestruke uvjerljive odgovore na pitanje. Mi implementiramo taj pristup na setu podataka GQA i pokažemo poboljšanje učinka.', 'az': 'GQA (CITATION) həqiqət-dünyanın göylü razılıq və kompozisyonal sual cavabı üçün verilən bir qurdur. GQA verilənlərin ən gözəl görünüş dili modellərinin tədbir edilən çox cavab gördük ki, yerdə həqiqət cavabına uyğun deyildir, amma hələ də bu məlumatlarda semantik anlamlı və düzgün deyildir. Əslində, bu, hər sual üçün yalnız bir yerli haqq cavabı hesab edirlər. Biz bu limiti çəkmək üçün Alternativ Cevap Setlərini (AAS) təbliğ edirik. NLP vasitələrindən avtomatik olaraq yaradılır. Biz AAS-a dayanan semantik metrik təşkil edirik və üst VQA çözücülərini soruşmaq üçün çoxlu inanılmaz cavab vermək üçün dəyişdiririk. Biz bu approach GQA veri qutusu ilə uygulayır və performans yaxşılıqlarını göstəririk.', 'ca': 'GQA (CITATION) és un conjunt de dades per al raonament visual del món real i la resposta a preguntes de composició. Vam descobrir que moltes respostes predites pels millors models de llenguatge de visió del conjunt de dades GQA no coincideixen amb la resposta terrestre-veritat però encara són semànticament significatives i correctes en el context dada. De fet, això és el cas amb la majoria de les preguntes visuals que responen a conjunts de dades (VQA) on suposen només una resposta de veritat per cada pregunta. Proposem Set de Responses Alternatives (AAS) de respostes de veritat fonamental per abordar aquesta limitació, que es crea automàticament fent servir eines NLP fora de plataforma. Introduïm una mètrica semàntica basada en AAS i modifiquem els millors solucions VQA per sostenir múltiples respostes plausibles a una pregunta. Implementam aquest enfocament en el conjunt de dades del GQA i demostram les millores del rendiment.', 'cs': 'GQA (CITATION) je datová sada pro reálné vizuální uvažování a kompoziční odpovědi na otázky. Zjistili jsme, že mnoho odpovědí předpovědí modelů nejlepšího jazyka vize v datasetu GQA neodpovídá odpovědi základní pravdy, ale stále jsou sémanticky smysluplné a správné v daném kontextu. Ve skutečnosti je tomu případ u většiny existujících datových sad zodpovězení vizuálních otázek (VQA), kde předpokládají pouze jednu odpověď základní pravdy pro každou otázku. Pro řešení tohoto omezení navrhujeme alternativní sady odpovědí (AAS) základních odpovědí, které jsou vytvořeny automaticky pomocí standardních NLP nástrojů. Představujeme sémantickou metriku založenou na AAS a upravujeme špičkové řešitele VQA tak, aby podporovaly více věrohodných odpovědí na otázku. Tento přístup implementujeme na datasadě GQA a ukazujeme zlepšení výkonu.', 'et': 'GQA (CITATION) on andmekogum reaalse visuaalse m繭tlemise ja kompositsioonik羹simustele vastamise kohta. Leidsime, et paljud GQA andmekogumi parimate n瓣gemiskeele mudelite prognoositud vastused ei vasta p繭hjalikule t繭ele vastusele, kuid on antud kontekstis siiski semantiliselt t瓣henduslikud ja 繭iged. Tegelikult on see nii enamiku olemasolevate visuaalsete k羹simustele vastamise (VQA) andmekogumite puhul, kus nad eeldavad iga k羹simuse kohta ainult 羹hte t繭ele vastavat vastust. Selle piirangu lahendamiseks pakume alternatiivseid vastuste komplekte (AAS), mis luuakse automaatselt, kasutades n繭ustamisprogrammi t繹繹riistu. Tutvustame AAS-il p繭hinevat semantilist meetrit ja muudame peamisi VQA lahendajaid, et toetada mitmeid usutavaid vastuseid k羹simusele. Rakendame seda l瓣henemisviisi GQA andmekogumis ja n瓣itame tulemuslikkuse paranemist.', 'fi': 'GQA (CITATION) on tietokokonaisuus reaaliaikaiseen visuaaliseen päättelyyn ja kompositiiviseen kysymykseen vastaamiseen. Havaitsimme, että monet GQA-aineiston parhaiden näkökielimallien ennustamat vastaukset eivät vastaa totuutta, mutta ovat silti semanttisesti merkityksellisiä ja oikeita kyseisessä kontekstissa. Tämä pätee useimpiin olemassa oleviin visuaalisiin kysymyksiin vastaamiseen (VQA) -tietokokonaisuuksiin, joissa kussakin kysymyksessä oletetaan vain yhden totuudenmukaisen vastauksen. Ehdotamme vaihtoehtoisia vastaussarjoja (AAS), jotka sisältävät totuudenmukaisia vastauksia tämän rajoituksen korjaamiseksi, joka luodaan automaattisesti käyttämällä valmiita NLP-työkaluja. Esittelemme AAS:ään perustuvan semanttisen metriikan ja muokkaamme parhaita VQA-ratkaisijoita tukemaan useita uskottavia vastauksia kysymykseen. Toteutamme tämän lähestymistavan GQA-aineistossa ja näytämme suorituskyvyn parannukset.', 'ha': "GQA (CITATIAN) wani tsari ne da ake samun sunãye na cikin duniya masu basĩri da masu haɗuwa da tambayi. Mun gane cewa masu yawa majibu wanda aka ƙayyade masu kyaun idãnun-harshen na gane kan GQA ba su yi daidai da jibar bangon gaske ba, kuma amma suna da muhimmin da ke daidaita cikin muhimman wanda aka bai wa. In gaske, wannan yana da masu tsari da masu ganin gani (vQA) da sune zaɓi karɓi sunan gaskiya kawai zuwa kowane tambayi. Tuna goyyar da masu iya amfani da shirin-shelf-NLP Tuna fara wani mitriki na semanti a kan ASA kuma Mu gyara masu samun masu nuna wa masu samun na kanzu na vQA dõmin ya ƙarfafa majibu masu yawa da za'a iya samun tambayi. Tuna zartar da wannan hanyor GQA na samun mafarin aiki.", 'he': 'GQA (ציטציה) הוא קבוצת נתונים עבור הגיון ויזואלי בעולם האמיתי ומעניין על שאלות מורכבות. We found that many answers predicted by the best vision-language models on the GQA dataset do not match the ground-truth answer but still are semantically meaningful and correct in the given context.  למעשה, זה המקרה עם רוב השאלות הנוכחיות שמענות על מידע (VQA) שבו הם מניחים רק תשובה אחת לאמת קרקע לכל שאלה. אנו מציעים קומות תשובות אלטרנטיביות (AAS) של תשובות אמת קרקעית כדי להתמודד עם הגבלה הזאת, שנוצרה באופן אוטומטי באמצעות כלי NLP מחוץ למדף. אנחנו מציגים מטריקה סמנטית מבוססת על AAS ולשינוי פתרוני VQA גבוהים כדי לתמוך בתשובות רבות אמיתיות לשאלה. אנו מפעילים את הגישה הזו על קבוצת מידע GQA ולהראות שיפורים ביצועים.', 'sk': 'GQA (CITATION) je nabor podatkov za resnično vizualno razmišljanje in kompozicijsko odgovarjanje na vprašanja. Ugotovili smo, da številni odgovori, ki jih napovedujejo najboljši modeli vizijskega jezika na naboru podatkov GQA, ne ujemajo z odgovorom resnice, vendar so še vedno semantično pomembni in pravilni v danem kontekstu. Pravzaprav to velja za večino obstoječih naborov podatkov o vizualnem odgovoru na vprašanja (VQA), kjer za vsako vprašanje predvidevajo samo en osnovni odgovor resnice. Za obravnavo te omejitve predlagamo alternativne nabore odgovorov (AAS), ki se samodejno ustvarjajo z uporabo orodij NLP, ki so na voljo. Uvedli smo semantično metriko, ki temelji na AAS, in spremenili vrhunske reševalce VQA, da bi podprli več verjetnih odgovorov na vprašanje. Ta pristop izvajamo na naboru podatkov GQA in prikazujemo izboljšave učinkovitosti.', 'jv': 'GqA (CITarTIon) iku dataset kanggo ngilanggar oleh-munggo nyatakakno karo pakem pisan sing dumadhi. Awak dhéwé éntuk akeh mbugal sing luwih saben ning model anyir-luwih sing luwih nêmên ning dataset GqA kuwi tenan éwé ugin segala macem sing beraksi ngono isih dumadhi iki sampeyan sing luwih dumadhi ngono iso dianggap. Ingan ngomong, iki iso karo perusahaan langkung sampek iso ngganti dataset (VqA) sing dadi, kawur sapa nyimpen bakal kotak sing arep mbutuhan kanggo sabên sesuk sabên langkung. We proposal Alternate responseSets (AASS) of background-true responses to Address this limitation, that is generated automatically with off-the-shell NLP tools. Awak dhéwé nyenggunaké semanti-Metik sing basa karo AASS lan ngubah perusahaan mulai VqA seneng nggawe barang langgar-pangrungu sing bisa pasang. Awak dhéwé ngerti perusahaan iki ning dataset GqA lan ngomatsi kapan-kapan kanggo ngerasakno kanggo awak dhéwé.', 'bo': 'GQA ང་ཚོས་GQA གནད་སྡུད་ཅིག་གི་མཐོང་སྣང་དང་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་མིག དངོས་གནས་ཚུལ། འདི་ནི་ལྟ་བུའི་གནད་སྡུད་ཀྱི་མིག་སྟོན་པའི་འདྲི་ཚིག་གི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན ང་ཚོས་རྒྱབ་ལྗོངས་ཀྱི་གནད་སྤེལ་སའི་སྒྲིག་ལན་པར་(AAS)རྒྱབ་ལྗོངས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡོད་ཚད་འདི་ལ་མཐུན་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོས་AAS་དང་མགོ་རིམ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སྔོན་མཐུན་གྱི་ཚད་རྩིས་འབྲེལ་བ་ཞིག་གསལ་བཤད་པ་ལ་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་གི་མཐུན་སྣུ ང་ཚོས་GQA གནད་སྡུད་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་ནས་ཡར་རྒྱས་སྐྱོར་བ་སྟོན་དགོས།'}
{'en': 'Better Neural Machine Translation by Extracting Linguistic Information from BERT', 'ar': 'ترجمة آلية عصبية أفضل عن طريق استخراج المعلومات اللغوية من BERT', 'pt': 'Melhor tradução automática neural extraindo informações linguísticas do BERT', 'fr': "Meilleure traduction automatique neuronale grâce à l'extraction d'informations linguistiques à partir du BERT", 'es': 'Mejor traducción automática neuronal mediante la extracción de información lingüística de BERT', 'ja': 'BERTから言語情報を抽出することで、より良い神経機械翻訳', 'zh': '取 BERT 语息以善神经机器翻译', 'hi': 'BERT से भाषाई जानकारी निकालने से बेहतर तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद', 'ru': 'Лучший нейронный машинный перевод путем извлечения лингвистической информации из BERT', 'ga': 'Aistriúchán Meaisín Níos Fearr Néarthach trí Fhaisnéis Teangeolaíoch a Bhaint as BERT', 'ka': 'BERT- ის ლინგუტიკური ინფორმაციის გამოყენებით უკეთესი ნეიროლური მაქინის გარგუმარება', 'el': 'Καλύτερη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση με εξαγωγή γλωσσικών πληροφοριών από το BERT', 'hu': 'Jobb idegi gépi fordítás nyelvi információk kivonásával a BERT-ből', 'it': 'Migliore traduzione automatica neurale estraendo informazioni linguistiche da BERT', 'mk': 'Better Neural Machine Translation by Extracting Linguistic Information from BERT', 'kk': 'BERT- ден лингвистикалық мәліметті тарқату арқылы нейрондық машинаның аудармасы жақсы', 'ms': 'Terjemahan Mesin Neural Lebih Baik Dengan Ekstrak Maklumat Bahasa Dari BERT', 'mn': 'BERT-ээс илүү сайн мэдээлэл гаргаж', 'ml': 'ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയില്\u200d നിന്നും ലിങ്ഗിസ്റ്റിക്ക് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എടുത്തുകൊണ്ട് നെയൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെട', 'lt': 'Geresnis nervinių mašinų vertimas ekstrahuojant kalbinę informaciją iš BERT', 'no': 'Berre neuralmaskinsomsetjing ved å pakka ut lingsinformasjon frå BERT', 'pl': 'Lepsze tłumaczenie maszynowe neuronalne dzięki wydobyciu informacji językowych z BERT', 'ro': 'Traducere automată neurală mai bună prin extragerea informațiilor lingvistice din BERT', 'si': 'BERT වෙනුවෙන් ලින්ග්විස්ටික තොරතුරු නිකාශික පද්ධතිය පරිවර්තනය', 'so': 'Turjumidda Neural Machine ka wanaagsan by Extracting Linguistic information from BERT', 'sr': 'Bolja neurološka prevoda izvlačenjem lingvističkih informacija iz BERT-a', 'sv': 'Bättre neural maskinöversättning genom att extrahera språklig information från BERT', 'mt': 'Traduzzjoni Aħjar tal-Makkinarju Newrali bl-Estrazzjoni tal-Informazzjoni Lingwistika mill-BERT', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'BERT سے لینگیستیک معلومات نکالنے کے ذریعہ بہتر نیورال ماشین ترجمہ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Dịch cỗ máy thần kinh tốt hơn bằng cách moi thông tin ngôn ngữ từ BERT', 'bg': 'По-добър неврален машинен превод чрез извличане на лингвистична информация от BERT', 'hr': 'Bolji prijevod neuroloških strojeva izvlačenjem lingvističkih informacija iz BERT-a', 'da': 'Bedre neural maskinoversættelse ved at udtrække sproglig information fra BERT', 'de': 'Bessere neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung durch Extraktion linguistischer Informationen aus BERT', 'nl': 'Betere neuronale machinevertaling door taalkundige informatie uit BERT te extraheren', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین عصبی بهتر با استخراج اطلاعات لینگیست از BERT', 'sw': 'Tafsiri bora ya Mashine ya Neural kwa Kutoa taarifa za Kilinguistic kutoka BERT', 'ko': 'BERT에서 언어 정보를 추출하여 더 나은 신경 기계 번역을 실현하다', 'id': 'Better Neural Machine Translation by Extracting Linguistic Information from BERT', 'af': 'Beter Neurale Masjien Vertaling deur te uittrek Linguistiese Informasie van BERT', 'tr': "BERT'den Hat Maglumaty Açmak üçin iň gowy Nural Maşynyň terjimesini", 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Përkthimi më i mirë i makinës nervore duke nxjerrë informacionin gjuhësor nga BERT', 'az': 'BERT t톛r톛find톛n Linguistik Mal칲mat캼n캼 칞캼xar캼b', 'hy': 'Ավելի լավ նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանություն, հանելով լեզվային տեղեկատվությունը BER-ից', 'bn': 'বেরেট থেকে লিঙ্গিস্টিক তথ্য বিনিময় করে ভালো নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ করুন', 'bs': 'Bolja neuronska prevoda izvlačenjem lingvističkih informacija iz BERT-a', 'cs': 'Lepší neuronový strojový překlad extrakcí jazykových informací z BERT', 'et': 'Parem neuroaalne masintõlge BERT-ist keeleteabe väljavõtmise teel', 'ca': 'millor traducció de màquines neuronals extraint informació lingüística del BERT', 'fi': 'Parempi neurokonekäännös poimimalla BERT:stä kielitietoa', 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop', 'he': 'תורגם וסונכרן ע"י Qsubs מצוות', 'ha': '@ info: status', 'sk': 'Boljši strojni nevronski prevod s pridobivanjem jezikovnih informacij iz BERT', 'bo': 'BERT ལས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་གནས་ཚུལ་ཕྱིར་འདོན་བྱས་ནས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་མིང་འཁོར་གྱི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཧ་པ'}
{'en': 'Adding linguistic information (syntax or semantics) to neural machine translation (NMT) have mostly focused on using point estimates from pre-trained models. Directly using the capacity of massive pre-trained contextual word embedding models such as BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) has been marginally useful in NMT because effective fine-tuning is difficult to obtain for NMT without making training brittle and unreliable. We augment NMT by extracting dense fine-tuned vector-based linguistic information from BERT instead of using point estimates. Experimental results show that our method of incorporating linguistic information helps NMT to generalize better in a variety of training contexts and is no more difficult to train than conventional Transformer-based NMT.', 'ar': 'ركزت إضافة المعلومات اللغوية (بناء الجملة أو الدلالات) إلى الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) في الغالب على استخدام تقديرات النقاط من النماذج المدربة مسبقًا. كان الاستخدام المباشر لقدرة نماذج تضمين الكلمات السياقية الضخمة المدربة مسبقًا مثل BERT (Devlin et al. ، 2019) مفيدًا بشكل هامشي في NMT لأنه من الصعب الحصول على الضبط الدقيق الفعال لـ NMT دون جعل التدريب هشًا وغير موثوق به. نقوم بزيادة NMT عن طريق استخراج معلومات لغوية كثيفة ومُحسَّنة بدقة تعتمد على المتجه من BERT بدلاً من استخدام تقديرات النقاط. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن طريقتنا في دمج المعلومات اللغوية تساعد NMT على التعميم بشكل أفضل في مجموعة متنوعة من سياقات التدريب وليس من الصعب تدريبها أكثر من NMT التقليدي القائم على المحولات.', 'fr': "L'ajout d'informations linguistiques (syntaxe ou sémantique) à la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) s'est principalement concentré sur l'utilisation d'estimations ponctuelles à partir de modèles pré-entraînés. L'utilisation directe de la capacité de modèles massifs d'intégration de mots contextuels pré-entraînés tels que BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) s'est avérée légèrement utile dans la NMT, car il est difficile d'obtenir un réglage précis efficace pour la NMT sans rendre la formation fragile et peu fiable. Nous augmentons la NMT en extrayant des informations linguistiques vectorielles précises et denses du BERT au lieu d'utiliser des estimations ponctuelles. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre méthode d'intégration de l'information linguistique aide le NMT à mieux se généraliser dans divers contextes de formation et n'est pas plus difficile à former que la NMT conventionnelle basée sur Transformer.", 'es': 'La adición de información lingüística (sintaxis o semántica) a la traducción automática neuronal (NMT) se ha centrado principalmente en el uso de estimaciones puntuales de modelos previamente entrenados. El uso directo de la capacidad de los modelos masivos de incrustación de palabras contextuales preentrenados como BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) ha sido marginalmente útil en NMT porque es difícil obtener un ajuste fino efectivo para NMT sin hacer que el entrenamiento sea frágil y poco fiable. Aumentamos la NMT extrayendo información lingüística basada en vectores ajustada y densa del BERT en lugar de utilizar estimaciones puntuales. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro método de incorporación de información lingüística ayuda a la NMT a generalizar mejor en una variedad de contextos de entrenamiento y no es más difícil de entrenar que la NMT convencional basada en Transformer.', 'pt': 'A adição de informações linguísticas (sintaxe ou semântica) à tradução automática neural (NMT) se concentrou principalmente no uso de estimativas pontuais de modelos pré-treinados. O uso direto da capacidade de modelos massivos de incorporação de palavras contextuais pré-treinados, como o BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), tem sido marginalmente útil em NMT porque o ajuste fino eficaz é difícil de obter para NMT sem tornar o treinamento frágil e não confiável. Aumentamos o NMT extraindo informações linguísticas densas e ajustadas com base em vetores do BERT em vez de usar estimativas pontuais. Os resultados experimentais mostram que nosso método de incorporar informações linguísticas ajuda a NMT a generalizar melhor em uma variedade de contextos de treinamento e não é mais difícil de treinar do que a NMT convencional baseada em Transformer.', 'ja': '神経機械翻訳（ NMT ）に言語情報（構文または意味論）を追加することは、ほとんどが事前に訓練されたモデルからのポイント推定値を使用することに焦点を当てています。BERT （ Devlin et al., 2019 ）のような大規模な事前訓練された文脈的単語埋め込みモデルの容量を直接使用することは、効果的な微調整が訓練を脆くし、信頼性を低下させることなくNMTのために入手することが困難であるため、NMTではわずかに有用である。我々は、点推定値を使用する代わりに、BERTから濃密な微調整されたベクトルベースの言語情報を抽出することによってNMTを増強する。実験結果は、言語情報を組み込む方法が、NMTが様々なトレーニングコンテキストでより一般化するのに役立ち、従来のトランスフォーマーベースのNMTよりもトレーニングが難しくないことを示しています。', 'zh': '凡言语信息(语法或语义)加神经机器翻译(NMT)中,要在预为模范之计。 直用大练者上下文词嵌模形(如BERT(Devlin等,2019))力在NMT中几无用,盖难于不脆不足之效也。 以BERT取密向量之微言息以强NMT,非用度也。 实验结果表明言整合息之道NMT益泛化于百教,非难于旧Transformal之NMT也。', 'ga': 'Trí fhaisnéis theangeolaíoch (chomhréir nó séimeantaic) a chur le haistriúchán meaisín néarach (NMT) díríodh go príomha ar úsáid a bhaint as meastacháin phointe ó mhúnlaí réamhoilte. Bhí úsáid dhíreach a bhaint as acmhainn na múnlaí ollmhóra réamhoilte um leabú focal comhthéacsúla ar nós BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) beagáinín úsáideach in NMT toisc go bhfuil sé deacair mionchoigeartú éifeachtach a fháil don NMT gan oiliúint a dhéanamh briosc agus neamhiontaofa. Méadóimid NMT trí fhaisnéis theangeolaíoch veicteora-bhunaithe dlúth mhionchoigeartaithe a bhaint as CRET in ionad meastacháin phointe a úsáid. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go gcabhraíonn ár modh chun faisnéis teanga a ionchorprú le NMT ginearálú níos fearr a dhéanamh i gcomhthéacsanna oiliúna éagsúla agus nach bhfuil sé níos deacra oiliúint a chur air ná an NMT traidisiúnta atá bunaithe ar an gClaochladán.', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) में भाषाई जानकारी (वाक्यविन्यास या शब्दार्थ) जोड़ना ज्यादातर पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित मॉडल से बिंदु अनुमानों का उपयोग करने पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया गया है। सीधे बड़े पैमाने पर पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित प्रासंगिक शब्द एम्बेडिंग मॉडल की क्षमता का उपयोग करना जैसे कि BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) NMT में मामूली रूप से उपयोगी रहा है क्योंकि प्रशिक्षण भंगुर और अविश्वसनीय बनाने के बिना NMT के लिए प्रभावी ठीक-ट्यूनिंग प्राप्त करना मुश्किल है। हम बिंदु अनुमानों का उपयोग करने के बजाय BERT से घने ठीक-ट्यून वेक्टर-आधारित भाषाई जानकारी निकालकर NMT को बढ़ाते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि भाषाई जानकारी को शामिल करने की हमारी विधि एनएमटी को विभिन्न प्रकार के प्रशिक्षण संदर्भों में बेहतर सामान्यीकरण करने में मदद करती है और पारंपरिक ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित एनएमटी की तुलना में प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए अधिक कठिन नहीं है।', 'ru': 'Добавление лингвистической информации (синтаксис или семантика) к нейронному машинному переводу (НМП) в основном сосредоточено на использовании точечных оценок из предварительно обученных моделей. Непосредственное использование возможностей массивных предварительно обученных моделей контекстного встраивания слов, таких как BERT(Devlin et al., 2019), было немного полезно в NMT, потому что эффективную точную настройку трудно получить для NMT, не сделав обучение хрупким и ненадежным. Мы увеличиваем НМТ, извлекая плотную, тонко настроенную векторную лингвистическую информацию из BERT вместо использования точечных оценок. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наш метод включения лингвистической информации помогает НМТ лучше обобщать в различных учебных контекстах и не сложнее обучаться, чем обычная НМТ на основе трансформатора.', 'hu': 'A nyelvi információk (szintaxis vagy szemantika) hozzáadása a neurális gépi fordításhoz (NMT) leginkább az előkészített modellekből származó pontbecslések használatára összpontosított. Az olyan masszív, előre képzett kontextuális szóbeágyazási modellek kapacitásának közvetlen felhasználása, mint a BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), marginálisan hasznos volt az NMT-ben, mivel a hatékony finomhangolás nehéz elérni az NMT számára anélkül, hogy az edzés törékeny és megbízhatatlan lenne. Az NMT-t úgy növeljük, hogy sűrű, finomhangolt vektoralapú nyelvi információkat vonunk ki a BERT-ből, ahelyett, hogy pontbecsléseket használnánk. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a nyelvi információk beépítésének módszere segít az NMT jobban általánosítani különböző képzési kontextusokban, és nem nehezebb edzeni, mint a hagyományos transzformátor alapú NMT.', 'ka': 'ლენგურისტიკური ინფორმაცია (სინტაქსი ან სიმენტიკი) ნეიროლური მაქანის გაგრძელებისთვის (NMT) დამატებაში უფრო მეტად კონუქტირებულია პირველი მოდელების გამოყენ მხოლოდ გამოყენება მასიური პრეტექსტური სიტყვას, როგორც BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) მარტიურად გამოყენებულია NMT-ში, რადგან ეფექტიური კონტექსტური კონტექსტური სიტყვას ძალიან ძალიან გამოყენებელია, რადგან ეფ ჩვენ NMT-ს გამოიყენებთ ბერტიდან ინფორმაციას, რომელიც ბერტიდან გამოიყენება წინასწორებული გვექტორიდან განსხვავებული ინფორმაცია. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები ჩვენი სიტყვების ინფორმაციის ჩვენება NMT-ს დახმარებს უფრო უკეთესი განსწავლების შესახებ და არ არის უფრო რთულია განსწავლების შესახებ, ვიდრე კონტრანსტრან', 'it': "L'aggiunta di informazioni linguistiche (sintassi o semantica) alla traduzione automatica neurale (NMT) si è concentrata principalmente sull'utilizzo di stime puntuali da modelli pre-addestrati. Utilizzare direttamente la capacità di massicci modelli di incorporazione contestuale pre-addestrati di parole come BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) è stato marginalmente utile in NMT perché è difficile ottenere una messa a punto efficace per NMT senza rendere l'allenamento fragile e inaffidabile. Aumentiamo l'NMT estraendo dense informazioni linguistiche vettoriali perfezionate da BERT invece di utilizzare stime puntuali. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il nostro metodo di incorporazione delle informazioni linguistiche aiuta l'NMT a generalizzare meglio in una varietà di contesti di formazione e non è più difficile da addestrare del tradizionale NMT basato su Transformer.", 'kk': 'Лингвистикалық мәліметтерді (синтаксис не semantiк) невралдық компьютердің аударуына (NMT) қосу көбінесе алдын- ала оқылған үлгілерден нүктеу бағаламаларын қолданады. BERT( Devlin et al., 2019) секілді үлгілер үлгілерінде массалық алдын- оқылған контекстуалды сөздерді ендіру мүмкіндігін қолдану NMT дегенде шегінен пайдалы болды, себебі NMT үшін әсер етілмейтін және сенімді болмайтын және оқылмайтын ба Біз NMT-ді бағалаудың орнына BERT-ден тілдік мәліметті тұратын вектордың негізінде тұрақты тілдік мәліметті тарқату арқылы көтереміз. Эксперименталдық нәтижелер біздің лингвистикалық мәліметті ендіру тәсіліміз NMT-ге көмектеседі, бірнеше тәжірибе тәсілдерінде жақсы көмектесетін және кәдімгі Трансформациялық N', 'lt': 'Papildant kalbinę informaciją (sintaksą arba semantiką) prie nervinių mašinų vertimo (NMT), daugiausia dėmesio buvo skiriama taškų įverčiams, gautiems iš iš anksto parengtų modelių. Tiesiog naudojant didžiulius iš anksto parengtus kontekstinius žodžių įterpimo modelius, pavyzdžiui, BERT(Devlin et al., 2019 m.), NMT buvo labai naudinga, nes NMT sunku veiksmingai patobulinti, nedarant mokymo trūkumų ir nepatikimų. Mes didiname NMT, ištraukdami tankią tikslią nuodugnią vektorių pagrindu pagrįstą kalbinę informaciją iš BERT, o ne naudojant taškų įverčius. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų kalbinės informacijos įtraukimo metodas padeda NMT geriau generalizuoti įvairiomis mokymo aplinkybėmis ir nėra sunkiau mokytis nei įprastinė NMT, pagrįsta transformuotojais.', 'ms': 'Menambah maklumat bahasa (sintaks atau semantik) ke terjemahan mesin saraf Menggunakan secara langsung kapasitas model penyembedding perkataan kontekstual pre-dilatih besar seperti BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) telah berguna secara marginal dalam NMT kerana penyesuaian yang efektif sukar untuk mendapatkan untuk NMT tanpa membuat latihan lemah dan tidak dipercayai. We augment NMT by extracting dense fine-tuned vector-based linguistic information from BERT instead of using point estimates.  Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kita untuk memasukkan maklumat bahasa membantu NMT untuk menyebarkan lebih baik dalam berbagai konteks latihan dan tidak lebih sukar untuk dilatih daripada NMT konvensional berasaskan Transformer.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷയിലേക്കു് ഭാഷ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതു് (സിന്റാക്സ് അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്സ്) മുന്\u200dപരിശീലന മോ BERT( Devlin et al., 2019) പോലുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d നേരിട്ട് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ കഴിവ് നേരെ ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. നിങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d പ്രയോജനപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന് ബെര്\u200dട്ടില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ബെര്\u200dട്ടില്\u200d നിന്നും കൂടുതല്\u200d സുന്ദരമായ വെക്റ്റര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി വിവരങ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ ഭാഷ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള രീതി', 'el': 'Η προσθήκη γλωσσικών πληροφοριών (σύνταξη ή σημασιολογία) στη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση (NMT) επικεντρώθηκε κυρίως στη χρήση εκτιμήσεων σημείων από προ-εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα. Η άμεση χρήση της ικανότητας μαζικών προ-εκπαιδευμένων μοντέλων ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων στο πλαίσιο, όπως είναι ο κ.λπ., ήταν οριακά χρήσιμος στο NMT επειδή ο αποτελεσματικός συντονισμός είναι δύσκολο να επιτευχθεί για NMT χωρίς να κάνει την εκπαίδευση εύθραυστη και αναξιόπιστη. Αυξάνουμε την NMT με την εξαγωγή πυκνών λεπτομέριων διανυσματικών γλωσσικών πληροφοριών από το BERT αντί να χρησιμοποιούμε εκτιμήσεις σημείων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος ενσωμάτωσης γλωσσικών πληροφοριών βοηθά το NMT να γενικεύσει καλύτερα σε ποικίλα εκπαιδευτικά πλαίσια και δεν είναι πιο δύσκολο να εκπαιδευτεί από το συμβατικό με μετασχηματιστή NMT.', 'mk': 'Додавањето на лингвистички информации (синтаксика или семантика) на преведувањето на невропските машини (НМТ) се фокусираше претежно на користењето на проценки на точките од предобучени модели. Директно користењето на капацитетот на масовните предобучени контекстни модели на вградување на зборови како што се BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) беше маргинално корисно во НМТ бидејќи е тешко да се постигне ефективно финетирање за НМТ без да се направи обуката слаба и недоверлива. We augment NMT by extracting dense fine-tuned vector-based linguistic information from BERT instead of using point estimates.  Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот метод за вклучување на лингвистичките информации помага на НМТ да генерализира подобро во различни контексти на обука и дека не е потешко да се обучува отколку конвенционалната НМТ со седиште во трансформи.', 'mt': 'Iż-żieda ta’ informazzjoni lingwistika (sintaks jew semantika) mat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali (NMT) iffukat l-aktar fuq l-użu ta’ stimi tal-punti minn mudelli mħarrġa minn qabel. L-użu dirett tal-kapaċità ta’ mudelli ta’ inkorporazzjoni ta’ kliem kuntestwali massivi mħarrġa minn qabel bħall-BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) kien marġinalment utli fl-NMT minħabba li huwa diffiċli li jinkiseb aġġustament effettiv għall-NMT mingħajr ma jsir it-taħriġ dgħajjef u mhux affidabbli. Aħna nżidu n-NMT billi nġibu informazzjoni lingwistika densa bbażata fuq il-vetturi rfini mill-BERT minflok nużaw stimi tal-punti. Riżultati esperimentali juru li l-metodu tagħna ta’ inkorporazzjoni ta’ informazzjoni lingwistika jgħin lill-NMT biex jiġġeneralizza a ħjar f’varjetà ta’ kuntesti ta’ taħriġ u mhuwiex aktar diffiċli biex jitħarreġ minn NMT konvenzjonali bbażat fuq it-Trasformer.', 'mn': 'Холбоо хэлний мэдээлэл (синтаксис эсвэл семантик) нь мэдрэлийн машины хөгжүүлэлт (NMT) дээр ихэнхдээ сургалтын өмнө сургалтын загварын тооцоололтыг ашиглан төвлөрсөн байдаг. БЕРТ(Девлин et al., 2019) гэх мэт олон дасгал дасгал хөгжүүлэх үгний чадварыг шууд ашиглан NMT-д бага зэрэг хэрэглэгддэг. Учир нь NMT-д эффективний дасгал хөгжүүлэх хэцүү болохоор суралцах болон итгэлцэхгүй байх нь хэцүү. Бид НМТ-г цэгийн тооцоололтоор ашиглахын оронд жинхэнэ тооцоололтой векторын үндсэн хэлний мэдээллийг BERT-ээс авч нэмэгдүүлнэ. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд бидний хэлний мэдээллийг нэгтгэх арга нь NMT-г олон төрлийн сургалтын тухайд илүү сайжруулахад тусалдаг бөгөөд энгийн Трансформацийн NMT-ээс илүү хэцүү байхгүй.', 'ro': 'Adăugarea informațiilor lingvistice (sintaxă sau semantică) la traducerea automată neurală (NMT) s-a concentrat în principal pe utilizarea estimărilor punctuale din modele pre-instruite. Utilizarea directă a capacității modelelor contextuale masive pre-instruite de încorporare a cuvintelor, cum ar fi BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), a fost extrem de utilă în NMT, deoarece reglarea fină eficientă este dificil de obținut pentru NMT fără a face formarea fragilă și nesigură. Îmbunătățim NMT prin extragerea informațiilor lingvistice dense și bine reglate bazate pe vectori din BERT în loc să folosim estimări punctuale. Rezultatele experimentale arată că metoda noastră de încorporare a informațiilor lingvistice ajută NMT să generalizeze mai bine într-o varietate de contexte de formare și nu este mai dificil de antrenat decât NMT convențional bazat pe Transformer.', 'no': 'Legg til lingviske informasjon (syntaks eller semantikk) til neuralmaskinsomsetjing (NMT) har hovudsakelig fokusert på bruk av punktestimalar frå før- trengte modeller. Direkt bruk av kapasiteten for massive først trengte kontekstiske ord innebyggingsmodeller som BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) er vanskeleg i NMT fordi effektiv finnstilling er vanskeleg å få for NMT utan å få opplæring brittle og ulevbar. Vi aukar NMT ved å pakka ut tett fyrste vektorbaserte lingvistiske informasjon frå BERT i staden for å bruka punktestimalar. Eksperimentale resultat viser at metoden vårt for å inkludere lingviske informasjon hjelper NMT til å generalisere betre i ein del treningskontekstar og er ikkje vanskeleg å trene enn konvensjonal transformeringsbasert NMT.', 'pl': 'Dodawanie informacji językowych (składni lub semantyki) do neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego (NMT) koncentruje się głównie na wykorzystaniu szacunków punktowych z wcześniej przeszkolonych modeli. Bezpośrednie wykorzystanie możliwości masywnych, wstępnie przeszkolonych modeli osadzania słów kontekstowych, takich jak BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) okazało się niewiele przydatne w NMT, ponieważ skuteczne dostrojenie jest trudne do uzyskania dla NMT bez czynienia treningu kruchym i niewiarygodnym. Rozszerzamy NMT poprzez ekstrakcję gęstych, precyzyjnie dostrojonych wektorowych informacji językowych z BERT zamiast używać szacunków punktowych. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasza metoda włączania informacji językowych pomaga NMT lepiej uogólnić w różnych kontekstach szkoleniowych i nie jest trudniejsza do treningu niż konwencjonalne NMT oparte na transformatorze.', 'sv': 'Att lägga till språklig information (syntax eller semantik) till neural maskinöversättning (NMT) har främst fokuserat på att använda punktskattningar från förutbildade modeller. Direkt användning av kapaciteten hos massiva pre-utbildade kontextuella ordinbäddningsmodeller som BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) har varit marginellt användbart i NMT eftersom effektiv finjustering är svår att få för NMT utan att göra träningen skör och opålitlig. Vi utökar NMT genom att extrahera tät finjusterad vektorbaserad språklig information från BERT istället för att använda punktskattningar. Experimentella resultat visar att vår metod att införliva språklig information hjälper NMT att generalisera bättre i en mängd olika träningssammanhang och inte är svårare att träna än konventionell Transformer-baserad NMT.', 'si': 'භාෂාත්මක තොරතුරු (වාක්ෂික හෝ සෙමැන්ටික්) න්\u200dයූරල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය (NMT) වලට වඩා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය ක ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) නිර්මාණයෙන් පුළුවන් විදිහට NMT වලට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ න අපි NMT විශ්වාස කරනවා පින්තූර අනුමාණය කරන්න බැරි වෙක්ටර් අධික භාෂාවික තොරතුරු BERT වලින් විශ්වාස කරනවා. පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිදේශය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ භාෂාත්මක තොරතුරු සම්පූර්ණ කරන විදියට NMT වෙනුවෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට හොඳ සාමාන්\u200dය විද', 'so': 'Macluumaadka luuqadaha (syntax ama semantics) oo lagu daray tarjumaadda maskaxda neurada (NMT) waxay ugu badnaan iskuulaysiiyeen isticmaalka qiimeynta qiimeeyaha midowga horay loo tababaray. Dir isticmaalka awoodda aad u badan ee hore-trained models embedding such as BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) ayaa si dhab ah ugu faa’iiday NMT, sababtoo ah sameynta suurtagal ah waa adag tahay inaad u hesho NMT iyadoon sameyn barashada brittle iyo aan la suurtoobayn. NMT waxey ku dareysaa in aan ka soo bixino macluumaad luuqad afka BERT oo ku saleysan wadista qiimaha. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in qaababka aan macluumaadka luuqadda ku qorno uu u caawinayo in NMT uu si ka wanaagsan u sameeyo qoraalo waxbarasho oo kala duduwan, mana aha mid ka adag in la tababaro wax ku tababar karo si ka mid ah NMT.', 'ta': 'புதிய இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (NMT) க்கு மொழிமாற்று தகவல் (syntax or semantics) சேர்க்கப்பட்டுள்ளது முன் பயிற்சி மாதிரிகளிலிருந்து புள்ள Directly using the capacity of massive pre-trained contextual word embedding models such as BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) has been marginally useful in NMT because effective fine-tuning is difficult to obtain for NMT without making training brittle and unreliable.  புள்ளியின் மதிப்புகளை பயன்படுத்துவதற்கு பதிலாக நாம் பிரெட்டிலிருந்து வெக்டர் சார்ந்த மொழிமாற்று தகவலை வெளியேற்றி N பரிசோதனை முடிவுகள் காட்டுகிறது நாம் மொழி தகவலை உள்ளிடுதல் முறைமையில் NMT சிறந்த பயிற்சி முறையில் பொதுவாக்க உதவுகிறது மற்றும் வழக்கமான மாற்று மு', 'ur': 'زبان شناسی معلومات (سینٹکس یا سیمانٹیکس) کو نیورل ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) کے ساتھ زیادہ دکھایا گیا ہے کہ نئورل ماشین کی ترجمہ (نئورل مٹی) سے نئورل مٹی کی تقریبا کے مطابق پوینٹ کی مستقیماً NMT میں زیادہ فائدہ اٹھایا گیا ہے کیونکہ عمدہ نیٹ تنظیم کو NMT کے لئے حاصل کرنے کے لئے مشکل ہے بغیر تکلیف کرنے کے. ہم NMT کو ٹیٹ کے مطابق گہرے ٹھیک ٹیٹر کی بوسیدہ زبان شناسی معلومات کو BERT سے اضافہ کر رہے ہیں Experimental results show that our method of incorporating linguistic information helps NMT to generalize better in a variety of training contexts and is not more difficult to train than conventional Transformer-based NMT.', 'sr': 'Dodanje jezičkih informacija (sintaksa ili semantika) na prevod neuralne mašine (NMT) uglavnom se fokusiralo na korištenje procenata tačke iz predobučenih modela. Direktno korištenje kapaciteta masovnih predobučenih kontekstualnih reèi ukljuèujućih modela kao što je BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) bila je marginalno korisna u NMT-u jer je teško dobiti efektivne finalizacije za NMT bez obzira na obuku britljive i nepouzdane. Povećavamo NMT izvlačenjem gustih ispravnih jezičkih informacija na vektoru, umjesto da koristimo procjene tačke. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naša metoda uključenja jezičkih informacija pomaže NMT da generalizuje bolje u raznim treningama i nije teže trenirati od konvencionalnog NMT-a na transformaciji.', 'uz': "Name Directly using the capacity of massive pre-trained contextual word embedding models such as BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) has been marginally useful in NMT because effective fine-tuning is difficult to obtain for NMT without making training brittle and unreliable.  Biz nuqta qiymatni ishlatishdan tashqi boʻlgan qiymatlar bilan BERT asosida yaxshi qizil vektor asosiy lingʻi maʼlumotini chiqarish uchun NMT'ni oshirimiz. Tajriba natijalarini ko'rsatish mumkin, tillar maʼlumotini kiritish usulini NMT turli tajribalarda yaxshi tajriba qilish imkoniyatini yordam beradi, va bu oddiy Transformer-asosiy NMT'dan o'rganish qiyin emas.", 'vi': 'Việc thêm thông tin ngôn ngữ (cú pháp hay ngữ pháp) vào dịch chuyển cỗ máy thần kinh (NMB) hầu hết đã tập trung vào việc sử dụng các ước lượng điểm từ các mẫu được đào tạo trước. Trực tiếp sử dụng khả năng cấy ghép từ ngữ ngữ ngữ huấn khổng lồ như BERT (Devlin et al., 99) đã vô cùng hữu ích trong công ty NMT bởi vì không dễ dàng đạt được hiệu quả độ cẩn thận cho NMB mà không làm huấn luyện giòn và đáng tin cậy. Chúng tôi nâng cao NMT bằng cách lấy thiết bị theo dấu tích tích tích tích tích theo dấu tích tích tích tích đặc biệt từ BERT thay vì sử dụng giá trị điểm. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp cung cấp thông tin ngôn ngữ giúp NMT sử dụng tốt hơn trong nhiều trường hợp huấn luyện khác nhau và không khó khăn hơn để huấn luyện thông thường NMT dựa trên biến hình.', 'da': 'Tilføjelse af sproglig information (syntaks eller semantik) til neural maskinoversættelse (NMT) har hovedsagelig fokuseret på at bruge punktestimater fra præ-trænede modeller. Direkte brug af kapaciteten fra massive prætrænede kontekstuelle ordindlejringsmodeller som BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) har været marginalt nyttigt i NMT, fordi effektiv finjustering er vanskelig at opnå for NMT uden at gøre træning skrøbelig og upålidelig. Vi øger NMT ved at udtrække tætte finjusterede vektorbaserede sproglige oplysninger fra BERT i stedet for at bruge punktestimater. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores metode til at indarbejde sproglig information hjælper NMT til at generalisere bedre i en række forskellige uddannelsessammenhænge og ikke er sværere at træne end konventionel Transformer-baseret NMT.', 'hr': 'Dodavanje jezičkih informacija (sintaksa ili semantika) na prevod neuralnih strojeva (NMT) uglavnom se fokusiralo na korištenje procjene tačke iz predobučenih modela. Direktno korištenje kapaciteta masivnih predobučenih contextualnih riječi uključujući modele kao što su BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) bila je marginalno korisna u NMT-u jer je teško dobiti učinkovito finaliziranje za NMT bez objašnjenja britljivog i neuvjerljivog treninga. Povećavamo NMT izvlačenjem gustih ispravnih jezičkih informacija s BERT-a umjesto koristeći procjene točki. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naša metoda uključenja jezičkih informacija pomaže NMT da generalizira bolje u raznim uvjetima obuke i nije teže trenirati od konvencionalnog NMT-a na transformaciji.', 'nl': 'Het toevoegen van linguïstische informatie (syntaxis of semantiek) aan neural machine translation (NMT) is vooral gericht op het gebruik van puntschattingen van vooraf getrainde modellen. Direct gebruik maken van de capaciteit van massieve vooraf getrainde contextuele woordinbeddingsmodellen zoals BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) is marginaal nuttig geweest in NMT omdat effectieve fine-tuning moeilijk te verkrijgen is voor NMT zonder training broos en onbetrouwbaar te maken. We vergroten NMT door dichte, verfijnde vector-gebaseerde linguïstische informatie uit BERT te extraheren in plaats van puntschattingen te gebruiken. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat onze methode van het integreren van linguïstische informatie NMT helpt om beter te generaliseren in een verscheidenheid van trainingscontexten en niet moeilijker te trainen is dan conventionele Transformer-gebaseerde NMT.', 'de': 'Das Hinzufügen linguistischer Informationen (Syntax oder Semantik) zur neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung (NMT) konzentriert sich hauptsächlich auf die Verwendung von Punktschätzungen aus vortrainierten Modellen. Die direkte Nutzung der Kapazität massiver vortrainierter kontextueller Wort-Einbettungsmodelle wie BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) war in NMT marginal nützlich, da eine effektive Feinabstimmung für NMT schwierig ist, ohne das Training brüchig und unzuverlässig zu machen. Wir erweitern NMT, indem wir dichte fein abgestimmte vektorbasierte linguistische Informationen aus BERT extrahieren anstatt Punktschätzungen zu verwenden. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unsere Methode der Einbeziehung von linguistischen Informationen NMT hilft, in einer Vielzahl von Trainingskontexten besser zu verallgemeinern und nicht schwieriger zu trainieren als herkömmliche Transformer-basierte NMT.', 'id': 'Menambahkan informasi bahasa (sintaks atau semantik) ke terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) kebanyakan fokus pada menggunakan perhitungan titik dari model pra-terlatih. Secara langsung menggunakan kapasitas dari model kontekstual pre-terlatih yang besar seperti BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) telah sedikit berguna di NMT karena penyesuaian efektif sulit untuk mendapatkan untuk NMT tanpa membuat pelatihan lemah dan tidak dipercaya. Kami meningkatkan NMT dengan mengekstraksi informasi lingwistik berkaitan dengan vektor yang tebal dari BERT bukannya menggunakan perhitungan titik. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa metode kami untuk memasukkan informasi bahasa membantu NMT untuk menyebarkan lebih baik dalam berbagai konteks pelatihan dan tidak lebih sulit dilatih daripada NMT konvensional berdasarkan Transformer.', 'ko': '언어 정보(문법 또는 의미)를 신경기계번역(NMT)에 추가하는 것은 주로 예훈련 모델에서 나온 점 평가를 사용하는 데 집중된다.미리 훈련된 수많은 문맥 단어 삽입 모형(예를 들어 BERT(Devlin et al., 2019)을 직접 사용하는 능력은 NMT에서 거의 쓸모가 없다. 훈련을 취약하고 신뢰할 수 없게 만들지 않으면 NMT가 효과적인 미세 조정을 얻기 어렵다.우리는 BERT에서 밀집된 미세 벡터 기반 언어 정보를 추출하여 NMT를 사용합니다.실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 언어 정보를 결합하는 방법은 NMT가 각종 훈련 환경에서 더욱 잘 범용되고 전통적인 변환기 기반의 NMT에 비해 훈련하는 데 어렵지 않다고 한다.', 'bg': 'Добавянето на лингвистична информация (синтаксис или семантика) към невронния машинен превод (НМТ) се фокусира предимно върху използването на точкови оценки от предварително обучени модели. Директното използване на капацитета на масивни предварително обучени контекстуални модели за вграждане на думи като е незначително полезно в НМТ, тъй като ефективно фино настройване е трудно да се получи за НМТ, без да прави обучението крехко и ненадеждно. Ние увеличаваме НМТ чрез извличане на плътна фино настроена векторна лингвистична информация от BERT вместо използване на точкови оценки. Експерименталните резултати показват, че методът ни за включване на лингвистична информация помага на НМТ да се генерализира по-добре в различни обучителни контексти и не е по-труден за обучение от конвенционалните НМТ базирани на трансформатори.', 'fa': 'اضافه کردن اطلاعات زبان\u200cشناسی (syntax or semantics) به ترجمه ماشین\u200cهای عصبی (NMT) بیشتر روی استفاده از تقدیم\u200cهای نقطه\u200cها از مدل\u200cهای پیش آموزش شده تمرکز شده\u200cاند. مستقیماً استفاده از توانایی کلمه پیش آموزش کلمه\u200cهای پیش آموزشی که مدل\u200cهای ابتدایی مانند BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) در NMT به اندازه\u200cی اندازه\u200cای فایده\u200cای داشته است، زیرا تنظیمات تاثیر\u200cگیری برای NMT بدون آموزش بی\u200cباوری و بی\u200cباوری سخت است. ما NMT را با اخراج از اطلاعات زبان\u200cشناسی که بر اساس ویکتور\u200cهای بسیار تنظیم است از BERT به جای استفاده از تقدیم نقطه\u200cها افزایش می\u200cدهیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cی ما نشان می\u200cدهد که روش شامل اطلاعات زبان\u200cشناسی ما به NMT کمک می\u200cکند که در مختلف شرایط آموزش بهتر بشه و از NMT سابق ترجمه\u200cکننده سابق سخت\u200cتر نیست.', 'sw': 'Kuongeza taarifa za lugha (syntax au semantics) kwa kutafsiri mashine ya kisasa (NMT) wamejikita zaidi kwa kutumia kadiri za points from models zilizofunzwa kabla. Kwa moja kwa kutumia uwezo wa maneno makubwa yaliyofunzwa kabla ya mafunzo kama vile BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) imekuwa na manufaa sana katika NMT kwa sababu mafunzo makubwa ni vigumu kupata NMT bila kutengeneza mafunzo na yasiyoeleweka. Tunaweza kuongeza NMT kwa kuondoa taarifa za lugha za lugha zilizoko kwenye vector yenye ujuzi mzuri kutoka BERT badala ya kutumia kadiria za pointi. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa njia yetu ya kuingiza taarifa za lugha inasaidia NMT kutengeneza vizuri katika mikutano mbalimbali ya mafunzo na si vigumu zaidi ya kufundisha zaidi ya NMT anayeishi kawaida.', 'af': "Voeg by lingwisiese inligting (sintaks of semantieke) na neurale masjien vertaling (NMT) meeste gefokus het op die gebruik van punt estimaties van vooraf- opgelei modele. Direkt gebruik die kapasiteit van massief voorafoerende kontekstuele woord inbetering modele soos BERT (Devlin et al., 2019) is marginaal gebruik in NMT omdat effektief fyn-tuning moeilik is om vir NMT te kry sonder om onderwerp te maak brittle en onvertroubaar. Ons vergroot NMT deur die uitpak van dens fyn-tuned vektor-gebaseerde lingvisiese inligting van BERT in plaas van die gebruik van punt estimaties. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat ons metode van die inkorporering van lingwisiese inligting hulp NMT om beter te genereer in 'n verskillende onderwerp konteks en is nie meer moeilik om te tref as konvensionale Transformer-gebaseerde NMT nie.", 'sq': 'Shtimi i informacionit gjuhësor (sintaks apo semantik) në përkthimin e makinave nervore (NMT) është përqëndruar kryesisht në përdorimin e vlerësimeve pikash nga modelet e paratrajnuar. Përdorimi drejtpërdrejt i kapacitetit të modeleve masive të paratrajnuara kontekstuale të përfshirjes së fjalëve të tilla si BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) ka qenë marginalisht i dobishëm në NMT sepse rregullimi efektiv është i vështirë për të arritur për NMT pa bërë trajnimin e dobët dhe të papërshtatshëm. Ne shtojmë NMT duke nxjerrë informacion gjuhësor të dendur të rregulluar me vektor nga BERT në vend që të përdorim vlerësime pikash. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se metoda jonë e përfshirjes së informacionit gjuhësor ndihmon NMT të gjeneralizojë më mirë në një shumicë kontekstesh trainimi dhe nuk është më e vështirë për të trajnuar se NMT tradicionale me bazë në Transformer.', 'tr': "Diller (syntaks ýa-da semantik) näyral maşynyň terjimesine (NMT) köplenç öňünden bilinmeli modellerden nokat taslamalaryny ulanmakda üns berildi. BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) NMT'de gaty uly öňünden öňünden eğlenen sözler taýýarlanmak ukyplarynyň ýerine ýetirmek kyn üçin NMT üçin ýüze çykmak kyn. NMT'i BERT'den yaklaşık tahmin etmek yerine, yoğun ve güçlü vektöre tabanlı lingvistik bilgileri çıkararak arttırıyoruz. Durmançylyk netijelerimiz lingwistiki maglumatlary ýerleşdirmek üçin NMT-a kömek edip görkezýär we düzgün Transformer-a tabanly NMT-dan has kyn däldir.", 'am': 'የቋንቋዊ መረጃ (syntax or semantics) ለመጠቀም የኮረብታው ማተርጓም (NMT) በተጨማሪው የቦታ ቁጥር ከመጀመሪያው ተማሪዎች ዓይነቶች በመጠቀም ተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ ብኤርቴን (Devlin et al., 2019) በመጠቀም በNMT ላይ የሚጠቅመው አካባቢ ስልጣንን በመጠቀም አቅራቢያ ጥቅም ሆኖአል፡፡ ምክንያቱም ለNMT ጥሩ ማግኘት አካባቢ ነው፡፡ የነጥብ ቁጥር በመጠቀም ፋንታ BERT የደረጃ የቋንቋዊ መረጃዎችን በመውጣት NMT እናጨምርበታለን፡፡ Experimental results show that our method of incorporating linguistic information helps NMT to generalize better in a variety of training contexts and is no more difficult to train than conventional Transformer-based NMT.', 'hy': "Adding linguistic information (syntax or semantics) to neural machine translation (NMT) have mostly focused on using point estimates from pre-trained models.  Անմիջապես օգտագործելով զանգվածային նախապատրաստված կոնտեքստալ բառերի ներգրավման մոդելներ, ինչպիսիք են BER(Devin et al., 2019), NMT-ում սահմանափակ օգտակար է, որովհետև NMT-ի համար դժվար է արդյունավետ փոփոխություններ հասնել առանց փոքր և անվստահելի պատրաստման: Մենք բարձրացնում ենք NMT-ը' ստանալով խիստ բարձրացված վեկտորների հիմնված լեզվաբանական տեղեկատվությունը BER-ից կետի հաշվարկների փոխարեն: Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ լեզվաբանական ինֆորմացիայի ներառման մեթոդը օգնում է NMT-ին ավելի լավ ընդհանրացնել կրթության բազմաթիվ կոնտեքստներում և ավելի դժվար չէ կրթություն անել, քան ավանդական Transforme-ի հիմնված NMT-", 'az': "Dil məlumatlarını (sintaks və semantik) nöral maşına çevirilənlərə (NMT) əlavə etmək çox öyrənməmiş modellerdən nöqtə təsirlərini istifadə etməyə odaqlandı. BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) kimi böyük əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş sözlərin istifadə edilməsi NMT içində çox faydalı idi çünki effektiv təhsil edilmə NMT üçün çox çətin və inanılmaz təhsil etmədən NMT üçün istifadə etmək çətindir. NMT'i BERT-dən istifadə etmək yerinə sıxıntılı düzəltmiş vektor tabanlı dil bilgiləri çıxarıb artırırıq. Müxtəlif sonuçlarımız elmi məlumatlarını birləşdirmək metodumuzun NMT'nin müxtəlif təhsil müxtəliflərində daha yaxşı təhsil etməsinə kömək edir və conventional Transformer-based NMT-dən daha çətin deyildir.", 'bn': 'নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদ (NMT) এর সাথে ভাষাগত তথ্য যোগ করা হচ্ছে বেশীরভাগ প্রশিক্ষিত মডেল থেকে বিন্দুর হিসাব ব্যবহার করে মনোযোগ দিয়েছে। সরাসরি প্রশিক্ষণ পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত বিবের্টি (ডেভেলিন এন্ট আল, ২০১৯) মডেল ব্যবহার করে এনএমটিতে ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে কারণ কার্যকর প্রশিক্ষণ ব্রিট এবং অবিশ্বাস্য না করে এনএমটির জন্য ক বিয়েন্ট হিসাব ব্যবহার করার পরিবর্তে আমরা এনএমটিকে বের্ট থেকে গভীর ভিত্তিক ভাষার তথ্য বের করে বেরিটি থেকে সুন্দর ভাষায় বি পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের ভাষাগত তথ্য যোগাযোগ করার পদ্ধতি এনএমটিকে সাহায্য করে বিভিন্ন প্রশিক্ষণ প্রতিযোগিতায় ভালোভাবে সৃষ্টি করার জন্য আর', 'bs': 'Dodavanje jezičkih informacija (sintaksa ili semantika) na prevod neuralne mašine (NMT) uglavnom se fokusiralo na upotrebu procjene tačke iz predobučenih modela. Direktno korištenje kapaciteta masivnih predobučenih contextualnih reči uključujući modele kao što su BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) bila je marginalno korisna u NMT-u jer je teško dobiti učinkovito finaliziranje za NMT, a ne činiti obuku velikim i nepouzdanim. Povećavamo NMT izvlačenjem gustih ispravnih jezičkih informacija na vektoru, umjesto koristeći procjene točki. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naša metoda uključenja jezičkih informacija pomaže NMT da generalizuje bolje u raznim treningama i nije teže trenirati od konvencionalnog NMT-a na transformaciji.', 'ca': "Aggregar informació lingüística (sintaxi o semàntica) a la traducció neural de màquines (NMT) s'han centrat principalment en l'ús d'estimacions puntuals de models pré-entrenats. Directly using the capacity of massive pre-trained contextual word embedding models such as BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) has been marginally useful in NMT because effective fine-tuning is difficult to obtain for NMT without making training brittle and unreliable.  augmentem la NMT extraint densa informació lingüística basada en vectors fins a punts de BERT en lloc d'utilitzar estimacions puntuals. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre mètode d'incorporació de la informació lingüística ajuda a la NMT a generalitzar-se millor en diversos contextos d'entrenament i no és més difícil d'entrenar que la NMT convencional basada en Transformer.", 'cs': 'Přidávání jazykových informací (syntaxe nebo sémantika) do neuronového strojového překladu (NMT) se většinou zaměřilo na použití bodových odhadů z předškolených modelů. Přímé využití kapacity masivních předškolených kontextových modelů vložení slov, jako je BERT(Devlin et al., 2019), bylo v NMT okrajově užitečné, protože efektivní jemné ladění je pro NMT obtížné získat, aniž by bylo trénink křehký a nespolehlivý. NMT rozšiřujeme extrakcí hustých jemně laděných vektorových jazykových informací z BERT namísto bodových odhadů. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že naše metoda začlenění jazykových informací pomáhá NMT lépe zobecňovat v různých tréninkových kontextech a není o nic obtížnější než konvenční transformátorové NMT.', 'et': 'Keelelise teabe (süntaksi või semantika) lisamine neuraalsele masintõlkele (NMT) on peamiselt keskendunud eelnevalt koolitatud mudelite punktihinnangute kasutamisele. Massiivsete eelnevalt koolitatud kontekstipõhiste sõnade manustamise mudelite, nagu BERT (Devlin jt., 2019), võimsuse otsene kasutamine on olnud NMT-s marginaalselt kasulik, sest tõhusat peenhäälestust on NMT-le raske saavutada, ilma et koolitus oleks hapras ja ebausaldusväärne. Täiendame NMT-d punktihinnangute asemel, ekstraheerides BERT-st tihedat peenhäälestatud vektoripõhist keelelist informatsiooni. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie keelelise informatsiooni kaasamise meetod aitab NMT-l paremini üldistada erinevates koolitustingimustes ja seda ei ole raskem koolitada kui tavapärast transformaatoril põhinevat NMT-d.', 'fi': 'Kielellisen tiedon (syntaksin tai semantiikan) lisääminen neurokonekäännökseen (NMT) on keskittynyt lähinnä pisteestimaattien käyttämiseen ennalta koulutetuista malleista. Massiivisten esikoulutettujen kontekstuaalisten sanaupotusmallien, kuten BERT:n (Devlin et al., 2019), kapasiteetin suora käyttö on ollut vähäistä NMT:ssä, koska tehokasta hienosäätöä on vaikea saada NMT:lle ilman, että koulutuksesta tulee haurasta ja epäluotettavaa. Lisäämme NMT:tä poimimalla BERT:stä tiheää hienoviritettyä vektoripohjaista kielitietoa pisteestimaattien sijaan. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että kielellisen tiedon yhdistämismenetelmämme auttaa NMT:tä yleistymään paremmin erilaisissa koulutusyhteyksissä eikä sitä ole vaikeampi kouluttaa kuin perinteinen Transformer-pohjainen NMT.', 'jv': 'Nyong-nambah informasi ning langgambar (seneng aksi lan semantasi) kang neluanggunakake dolanan ingkang (NMT) text-tool-action We artment NMT by extract Dene Pamita sing paling-perbudhakan langkung ngerasai punika awak dhéwé nggawe informasi ingkang nggawe NMT nggawe ngubah sing luwih apik dhéwé, lan ora susahé sak cara-luwih kanggo kuwi nggawe Transformer sing basa NMT.', 'he': 'הוספת מידע שפתי (סינטקס או סמנטיקה) לתרגום מכונות עצביות (NMT) התמקדו בעיקר בשימוש בערכות נקודות ממודלים מאומנים מראש. שימוש ישירות ביכולת של מודלים מסיביים של מילים קונטקסטיים מאומנים מראש, כמו BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) היה שימושי באופן קטן בני-אם-טי בגלל שקשה להשיג התאמה יעילה עבור אן-אם-טי בלי להפוך את האימונים חסרי אמון וחסרי אמון. We augment NMT by extracting dense fine-tuned vector-based linguistic information from BERT instead of using point estimates.  Experimental results show that our method of incorporating linguistic information helps NMT to generalize better in a variety of training contexts and is no more difficult to train than conventional Transformer-based NMT.', 'ha': "Additional information on linguistic (syntax or semantic) zuwa translation of mashine neura (NMT) sun yi zura ido mafi yawa, ana yi amfani da ƙidãya masu tsarin point daga motel masu yin taƙaita ta gabã ɗaya. Directly used the abiliti of massive pre-Training current word embedding Models such as BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) has been amfani da mara ya kwance a cikin NMT, kwani an yi amfani da mai amfani da gyangicin tsari mai girma to get for NMT, bã da samurin brittle and inaccessible. Mu ƙara NMT da za'a sami tsari ga linguistic wanda ke samar da shi mai nau'i mai kyau daga BERT Matarin jarrabai na nuna cewa metoden mu shigar da information cikin linguistic, yana taimakon NMT ya ƙara shi da mafi alhẽri a cikin wasu matardo na zaman aikin wahalar kuma bai zama mafi adadi ga wa'anar wa'anar a kawaici na Transformer-based NMT.", 'sk': 'Dodajanje jezikovnih informacij (sintaksa ali semantika) nevronskemu strojnemu prevajanju (NMT) se je večinoma osredotočilo na uporabo točkovnih ocen iz vnaprej usposobljenih modelov. Neposredna uporaba zmogljivosti množičnih vnaprej usposobljenih kontekstualnih modelov vključevanja besed, kot je BERT (Devlin et al., 2019), je bila v NMT minimalno koristna, saj je učinkovito fino nastavitev težko doseči za NMT, ne da bi usposabljanje postalo krhko in nezanesljivo. NMT dopolnjujemo z ekstrakcijo gostih finih vektorskih jezikovnih informacij iz BERT namesto uporabe točkovnih ocen. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naša metoda vključevanja jezikovnih informacij pomaga NMT bolje posplošiti v različnih kontekstih usposabljanja in ni težje usposabljati kot običajni transformatorski NMT.', 'bo': 'Adding linguistic information (syntax or semantics) to neural machine translation (NMT) have mostly focused on using point estimates from pre-trained models. སྔོན་གྱིས་འཇུག་སྒོ་བརྗོད་པའི་ཆེ་བ་སྔོན་གྲངས་ཡོད་པའི་གཟུགས་རིས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་དཔེར་ན། BERT(Devlin et al., 2019) འདི་NMT ནང་དུ་ཕན་ཐོགས་བྱས་ཟེར་བ་རེད། གང་ལེགས་སྐྱེན་བཟོ་ We augment NMT by extracting dense fine-tuned vector-based linguistic information from BERT instead of using point estimates. Experimental results show that our method of incorporating linguistic information helps NMT to generalize better in a variety of training contexts and is not more difficult to train than conventional Transformer-based NMT.'}
{'en': 'CLiMP : A Benchmark for Chinese Language Model Evaluation', 'es': 'CLiMP: un punto de referencia para la evaluación de modelos de idioma', 'pt': 'CLiMP: uma referência para avaliação do modelo de idioma chinês', 'ar': 'CLiMP: معيار لتقييم نموذج اللغة الصينية', 'fr': "CliMP\xa0: une référence pour l'évaluation des modèles de langue chinoise", 'zh': 'CLiMP:汉语言质', 'ja': 'CLiMP ：中国語モデル評価のためのベンチマーク', 'hi': 'CLiMP: चीनी भाषा मॉडल मूल्यांकन के लिए एक बेंचमार्क', 'ru': 'CLiMP: эталон для оценки модели китайского языка', 'ga': 'CLiMP: Tagarmharc do Mheasúnú Múnla Teanga na Síne', 'hu': 'CLiMP: A referenciaérték a kínai nyelvi modell értékeléséhez', 'it': 'CLiMP: un benchmark per la valutazione del modello di lingua cinese', 'lt': 'CLiMP: Kinijos kalbos modelio vertinimo lyginamasis rodiklis', 'ka': 'CLiMP: ჩინეთის ენის მოდელის განსაზღვრებისთვის ბენქმარი', 'kk': 'CLiMP: Қытай тіл үлгісін оқу белгісі', 'ml': 'സിലിപ്പി: ചൈനീസ് ഭാഷ മോഡേല്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക്', 'el': 'Ένα δείκτη αναφοράς για την αξιολόγηση μοντέλων κινεζικής γλώσσας', 'ms': 'CLiMP: Bentangan untuk Evaluasi Model Bahasa Cina', 'mn': 'CLiMP: Хятад хэл загварын үнэлэх банкмарк', 'sr': 'CLiMP: Benchmark za evaluaciju kineskog jezičkog modela', 'ro': 'CLiMP: Un criteriu de referință pentru evaluarea modelului de limbă chineză', 'mk': 'КЛИМП: Порачник за евалуација на моделот на кинески јазик', 'so': 'CLiMP: Baaritaanka Modelka Luqada Shiino', 'mt': 'CLiMP: Benchmark għall-Valutazzjoni tal-Mudell tal-Lingwa Ċiniża', 'pl': 'CLiMP: Wskaźnik odniesienia dla oceny modelu języka chińskiego', 'ta': 'CLiMP: சீன மொழி மாதிரி மதிப்பு', 'no': 'CLiMP: Eit benchmark for kinesisk språk modelleevaluering', 'sv': 'CLiMP: Ett riktmärke för utvärdering av kinesiska språkmodeller', 'ur': 'CLiMP: چین زبان موڈل ارزیابی کے لئے ایک بنچم مارک', 'si': 'CLiMP: චීනි භාෂා මොඩේල් විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා බෙන්ච්මාර්ක්', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': '[GIlP: A Chuẩn phòng cho mô hình ngôn ngữ Trung Quốc', 'bg': 'Референтен показател за оценка на модела на китайски език', 'hr': 'CLiMP: Pregled procjene kineskog jezičkog modela', 'id': 'CLiMP: Benchmark untuk Evaluasi Model Bahasa Cina', 'ko': 'CliMP: 중국어 모형 평가의 기준', 'fa': 'CLiMP: یک برچسب برای ارزیابی مدل زبان چینی', 'nl': 'CLiMP: Een Benchmark voor de Evaluatie van het Chinese Taalmodel', 'da': 'CLiMP: Et benchmark for vurdering af kinesisk sprogmodel', 'sw': 'CLiMP: Uthibitisho wa Modeli ya Lugha za Kichina', 'tr': 'CLiMP: Çinçe Diller nusgasy', 'de': 'CLiMP: Ein Benchmark für die Bewertung des chinesischen Sprachmodells', 'af': "CLiMP: ' n Benchmark vir Sjinese Taal Model Evaluering", 'am': 'የቻይና ቋንቋ ሞዴል አውቶማቲክ', 'hy': 'Չինաստանի լեզվի մոդելի գնահատման համեմատական նշան է', 'az': 'CLiMP: 칂in Dili Modeli Q톛rcl톛m톛si 칲칞칲n bir Benchmark', 'bn': 'সিলিএমপি: চীনা ভাষার মোডেল মুক্তির জন্য একটি বাংমার্ক', 'cs': 'CLiMP: Benchmark pro hodnocení modelu čínského jazyka', 'ca': "CLiMP: Un punt de referència per a l'evaluació del model de llenguatge xinès", 'bs': 'CLiMP: Benchmark za ocjenu kineskog jezičkog modela', 'et': 'CLiMP: Hiina keele mudeli hindamise võrdlusnäitaja', 'fi': 'CLiMP: Kiinan kielen malliarvioinnin vertailuarvo', 'sq': 'CLiMP: Një shenjë për vlerësimin e modelit të gjuhës kineze', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'CLiMP: A Benchmark for Chinese Language Model Evaluation', 'sk': 'CLiMP: referenčna vrednost za ocenjevanje modela kitajskega jezika', 'jv': 'CLiMP: A Bench for Chinese Language model invaluation', 'bo': 'CLiMP: A Benchmark for Chinese Language Model Evaluation'}
{'en': 'Linguistically informed analyses of language models (LMs) contribute to the understanding and improvement of such models. Here, we introduce the corpus of Chinese linguistic minimal pairs (CLiMP) to investigate what knowledge Chinese LMs acquire. CLiMP consists of sets of 1000 minimal pairs (MPs) for 16 syntactic contrasts in Chinese, covering 9 major Chinese linguistic phenomena. The MPs are semi-automatically generated, and human agreement with the labels in CLiMP is 95.8 %. We evaluate 11 different LMs on CLiMP, covering n-grams, LSTMs, and Chinese BERT. We find that classifiernoun agreement and verb complement selection are the phenomena that models generally perform best at. However, models struggle the most with the ba construction, binding, and filler-gap dependencies. Overall, Chinese BERT achieves an 81.8 % average accuracy, while the performances of LSTMs and 5-grams are only moderately above chance level.', 'ar': 'تساهم التحليلات المستنيرة لغويًا للنماذج اللغوية (LMs) في فهم هذه النماذج وتحسينها. هنا ، نقدم مجموعة من أزواج الحد الأدنى من اللغويات الصينية (CLiMP) لاستقصاء المعرفة التي تكتسبها LMs الصينية. يتكون CLiMP من مجموعات من 1000 زوج من الحد الأدنى (MPs) لـ 16 تناقضًا نحويًا في اللغة الصينية ، تغطي 9 ظواهر لغوية صينية رئيسية. يتم إنشاء أعضاء البرلمان بشكل شبه تلقائي ، والاتفاق البشري مع الملصقات في CLiMP هو 95.8٪. قمنا بتقييم 11 LMs مختلفة على CLiMP ، تغطي n-grams و LSTMs و BERT الصينية. نجد أن اتفاق المصنف-الاسم واختيار تكملة الفعل هما الظواهر التي تقدم النماذج بشكل عام أفضل أداء فيها. ومع ذلك ، فإن النماذج تكافح أكثر من غيرها مع تبعيات البناء والتجليد وفجوة الحشو. بشكل عام ، تحقق BERT الصينية متوسط دقة بنسبة 81.8٪ ، في حين أن أداء LSTMs و 5 جرامات أعلى بشكل معتدل من مستوى الفرصة.', 'es': 'Los análisis lingüísticamente informados de los modelos lingüísticos (LM) contribuyen a la comprensión y mejora de dichos modelos. A continuación, presentamos el corpus de pares mínimos lingüísticos chinos (CLiMP) para investigar qué conocimientos adquieren los LM chinos. CLiMP consiste en conjuntos de 1000 pares mínimos (MP) para 16 contrastes sintácticos en chino, que cubren 9 fenómenos lingüísticos chinos principales. Los MP se generan semiautomáticamente, y la concordancia humana con las etiquetas de CLiMP es del 95,8%. Evaluamos 11 LM diferentes en CLiMP, que cubren n-gramas, LSTM y BERT chino. Encontramos que la concordancia clasificador-sustantivo y la selección de complemento verbal son los fenómenos en los que los modelos generalmente se desempeñan mejor. Sin embargo, los modelos son los que más luchan con las dependencias de construcción, encuadernación y relleno de huecos. En general, el BERT chino logra una precisión promedio del 81,8%, mientras que los rendimientos de los LSTM y los 5 gramos están solo moderadamente por encima del nivel de probabilidad.', 'fr': "Les analyses linguistiques des modèles linguistiques (LM) contribuent à la compréhension et à l'amélioration de ces modèles. Ici, nous présentons le corpus de paires linguistiques minimales chinoises (CliMP) pour étudier les connaissances acquises par les LMS chinois. CliMP se compose d'ensembles de 1000 paires minimales (MP) pour 16 contrastes syntaxiques en chinois, couvrant 9 phénomènes linguistiques majeurs en chinois. Les MP sont générés de manière semi-automatique, et l'accord humain avec les étiquettes dans CliMP est de 95,8\xa0%. Nous évaluons 11 LM différents sur CliMP, couvrant les n-grammes, les LSTM et le BERT chinois. Nous trouvons que l'accord classificateur—nom et la sélection du complément verbal sont les phénomènes pour lesquels les modèles sont généralement les plus performants. Cependant, les modèles ont le plus de difficultés avec la construction ba, la liaison et les dépendances de remplissage. Dans l'ensemble, le BERT chinois atteint une précision moyenne de 81,8\xa0%, tandis que les performances des LSTM et des 5 grammes ne sont que modérément supérieures au niveau aléatoire.", 'pt': 'Análises linguísticamente informadas de modelos de linguagem (LMs) contribuem para a compreensão e aprimoramento de tais modelos. Aqui, apresentamos o corpus de pares mínimos linguísticos chineses (CLiMP) para investigar qual conhecimento os LMs chineses adquirem. CLiMP consiste em conjuntos de 1000 pares mínimos (MPs) para 16 contrastes sintáticos em chinês, abrangendo 9 fenômenos linguísticos chineses principais. Os MPs são gerados de forma semiautomática e a concordância humana com os rótulos no CLiMP é de 95,8%. Avaliamos 11 LMs diferentes no CLiMP, abrangendo n-grams, LSTMs e BERT chinês. Descobrimos que a concordância entre o classificador e o substantivo e a seleção do complemento verbal são os fenômenos nos quais os modelos geralmente têm melhor desempenho. No entanto, os modelos lutam mais com a construção ba, vinculação e dependências de preenchimento de lacunas. No geral, o BERT chinês atinge uma precisão média de 81,8%, enquanto os desempenhos dos LSTMs e 5 gramas estão apenas moderadamente acima do nível de chance.', 'ja': '言語情報に基づいた言語モデル（ ＬＭ ）の分析は、そのようなモデルの理解と改善に寄与する。ここでは、中国の言語最小対（ CLiMP ）のコーパスを紹介して、中国のLMがどのような知識を獲得するかを調査します。CLiMPは、中国語の16の構文コントラストのための1000の最小ペア（ MPS ）のセットで構成されており、9つの主要な中国語の言語現象をカバーしています。ＭＰＳは半自動的に生成され、ＣＬｉＭＰにおける標識とのヒトの合意は９ ５ ． ８ ％である。我々は、ｎグラム、ＬＳＴＭ、及び中国ＢＥＲＴをカバーする、ＣＬｉＭＰ上の１ １の異なるＬＭを評価する。分類子-名詞の一致と動詞の補語の選択は、モデルが一般的に最もよく機能する現象であることがわかります。しかしながら、モデルは、ba構築、結合、およびフィラーギャップ依存性に最も苦労する。全体として、中国のBERTは81.8 ％の平均精度を達成していますが、LSTMと5グラムの性能はチャンスレベルをわずかに上回っています。', 'zh': '语言(LM)者语言学析而改之。 此言最小(CLiMP)语料库,以究LM得之。 CLiMP以1000最小(MPs)成,以16中文句法比,涵盖9汉语之大者也。 MP者,半自动生也,人CLiMP之一致性为95.8%。 CLiMP上评11种不同LM,包n-gram,LSTM与中文BERT。 见分类词-名词一致性与动词补码择模形常最上者。 然 ba 构、绑定、充间之难为大。 总体而言中国BERT均准确率为81.8%,而LSTM5克仅略高于机会。', 'ru': 'Лингвистически обоснованный анализ языковых моделей (ЛМ) способствует пониманию и совершенствованию таких моделей. Здесь мы представляем корпус китайских языковых минимальных пар (CLiMP), чтобы исследовать, какие знания приобретают китайские LM. CLiMP состоит из наборов из 1000 минимальных пар (MPS) для 16 синтаксических контрастов в китайском языке, охватывающих 9 основных китайских лингвистических явлений. МПС генерируются полуавтоматически, и согласие человека с этикетками в CLiMP составляет 95,8%. Мы оцениваем 11 различных LM на CLiMP, охватывающих n-граммы, LSTM и китайский BERT. Мы находим, что согласование между классификатором и существительным и выбор глагола комплемента являются явлениями, в которых модели обычно работают лучше всего. Тем не менее, модели сталкиваются с наибольшими трудностями при построении ba, связывании и зависимостях «заполнитель-зазор». В целом, китайский BERT достигает средней точности 81,8%, в то время как показатели LSTM и 5-граммов лишь умеренно выше уровня случайности.', 'hi': 'भाषा मॉडल (एलएम) के भाषाई रूप से सूचित विश्लेषण ऐसे मॉडलों की समझ और सुधार में योगदान करते हैं। यहां, हम चीनी भाषाई न्यूनतम जोड़े (CLiMP) के कॉर्पस को पेश करते हैं ताकि यह पता लगाया जा सके कि चीनी एलएम क्या ज्ञान प्राप्त करते हैं। CLiMP में चीनी में 16 वाक्यात्मक विरोधाभासों के लिए 1000 न्यूनतम जोड़े (सांसदों) के सेट होते हैं, जो 9 प्रमुख चीनी भाषाई घटनाओं को कवर करते हैं। सांसद अर्ध-स्वचालित रूप से उत्पन्न होते हैं, और CLiMP में लेबल के साथ मानव समझौता 95.8% है। हम CLiMP पर 11 अलग-अलग LMs का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, जो n-grams, LSTMs और Chinese BERT को कवर करते हैं। हम पाते हैं कि क्लासिफायर-संज्ञा समझौते और क्रिया पूरक चयन ऐसी घटनाएं हैं जो मॉडल आमतौर पर सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन करते हैं। हालांकि, मॉडल बीए निर्माण, बाध्यकारी और भराव-अंतराल निर्भरताओं के साथ सबसे अधिक संघर्ष करते हैं। कुल मिलाकर, चीनी BERT एक 81.8% औसत सटीकता प्राप्त करता है, जबकि LSTMs और 5-ग्राम का प्रदर्शन केवल मामूली रूप से मौका स्तर से ऊपर है।', 'ga': 'Cuidíonn anailísí atá eolasach ó thaobh na teanga de ar shamhlacha teanga (LManna) le tuiscint agus feabhsú na múnlaí sin. Anseo, tugaimid isteach corpas na bpéirí íosta teanga Sínise (CLiMP) chun an t-eolas a fhaigheann LM na Síne a fhiosrú. Is éard atá i CLiMP tacair de 1000 péire íosta (MP) le haghaidh 16 chodarsnacht chomhréire sa tSínis, a chlúdaíonn 9 mór-fheiniméin teanga Síneach. Gintear na Básanna go leath-uathoibríoch, agus is ionann comhaontú an duine leis na lipéid i CLiMP agus 95.8%. Déanaimid meastóireacht ar 11 LM éagsúil ar CLiMP, a chlúdaíonn n-gram, LSTM, agus BERT Síneach. Faighimid amach gurb iad comhaontú aicmitheora-ainmfhocail agus roghnú comhlántach briathar na feiniméin is fearr a fheidhmíonn múnlaí go ginearálta. Mar sin féin, is mó a bhíonn ag streachailt leis na samhlacha ná na spleáchais ba tógála, ceangailteach agus líonadh bearna. Tríd is tríd, baineann BERT na Síne amach meánchruinneas 81.8%, cé nach bhfuil feidhmíochtaí LSTManna agus 5-gram ach beagán os cionn leibhéal na seans.', 'ka': 'Linguistically informed analyses of language models (LMs) contribute to the understanding and improvement of such models. აქ ჩვენ ჩინეთი ლინგურისტიკური მინიმალური ზოგების კორპუსს გაჩვენებთ, რომლებიც ჩინეთი ლინგურისტიკური მინიმალური ზოგები იყოს. CLiMP არის 1000 მინიმალური ზოგების (MPs) ნაწილი 16 სინტაქტიური კონტრასტის კონტრასტის კონტრასტის კონტრასტის კონტრასტის კონტრასტის კონტრასტის კონტ MPs არიან ნახევატომატურად შექმნილი, და ადამიანის შესაძლებლობა CLiMP-ის etiket-ის 95.8%-ია. ჩვენ CLiMP-ზე 11 განსხვავებული LMs გაუმუშაობთ, n-გრამის, LSTMs და ჩინეთი BERT-ზე. ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ კლასიფიკაციური სახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსახელსა მაგრამ მოდელები უფრო მეტი ბის შექმნა, დაკავშირება და დაყენება განსაკუთრებით. ყველაფერად, ჩინეთი BERT მიიღება სინამდვილეში 81,8% სინამდვილეობა, მაგრამ LSTMs და 5-გრამის გამოყენება მხოლოდ სინამდვილეობის დონეზე უფრო მედირე.', 'el': 'Οι γλωσσικά ενημερωμένες αναλύσεις γλωσσικών μοντέλων συμβάλλουν στην κατανόηση και βελτίωση αυτών των μοντέλων. Εδώ, εισάγουμε το σώμα των κινεζικών γλωσσικών ελάχιστων ζευγαριών (CLiMP) για να διερευνήσουμε τι γνώσεις αποκτούν τα κινεζικά LM. Το CLiMP αποτελείται από σύνολα 1000 ελάχιστων ζευγαριών (MP) για 16 συντακτικές αντιθέσεις στα κινεζικά, καλύπτοντας εννέα σημαντικά κινεζικά γλωσσικά φαινόμενα. Οι βουλευτές δημιουργούνται ημιαυτόματα και η ανθρώπινη συμφωνία με τις ετικέτες στο CLiMP είναι 95.8%. Αξιολογούμε 11 διαφορετικά LM σε CLiMP, καλύπτοντας n-γραμμάρια, LSTMs και κινεζικό BERT. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι η συμφωνία ταξινομητή-ουσιαστικού και η επιλογή συμπληρωμάτων ρήματος είναι τα φαινόμενα στα οποία τα μοντέλα γενικά αποδίδουν καλύτερα. Ωστόσο, τα μοντέλα αγωνίζονται περισσότερο με τις εξαρτήσεις κατασκευής, σύνδεσης και κενού πλήρωσης. Συνολικά, ο κινεζικός BERT επιτυγχάνει μια 81,8% μέση ακρίβεια, ενώ οι επιδόσεις των LSTMs και των 5-γραμμάτων είναι μέτρια μόνο πάνω από το επίπεδο πιθανότητας.', 'it': "Le analisi linguistiche informate dei modelli linguistici (LM) contribuiscono alla comprensione e al miglioramento di tali modelli. Qui presentiamo il corpus di coppie linguistiche minime cinesi (CLiMP) per indagare quali conoscenze acquisiscono gli LM cinesi. CLiMP è costituito da set di 1000 coppie minime (MP) per 16 contrasti sintattici in cinese, coprendo 9 principali fenomeni linguistici cinesi. I MP sono generati semi-automaticamente e l'accordo umano con le etichette in CLiMP è del 95,8%. Valutiamo 11 diversi LM su CLiMP, coprendo n-grammi, LSTMs e BERT cinese. Troviamo che l'accordo classificatore-sostantivo e la selezione del complemento verbale sono i fenomeni in cui i modelli generalmente funzionano meglio. Tuttavia, i modelli lottano di più con le dipendenze ba costruzione, binding e filler-gap. Nel complesso, BERT cinese raggiunge una precisione media dell'81,8%, mentre le prestazioni di LSTMs e 5 grammi sono solo moderatamente al di sopra del livello di probabilità.", 'kk': 'Лингистикалық мәліметті тіл үлгілерінің анализациялары (LMs) бұл үлгілерді түсінуге және жақсартуға көмектеседі. Мұнда, Қытай лингвистикалық төменгі екі корпусын (CLiMP) Қытай LMs қандай білім алуын зерттеу үшін таңдаймыз. CLiMP қытайша 16 синтактикалық контрастықтары үшін 1000 төменгі екі (MPs) жиындарынан тұрады, 9 негізгі қытайша лингвистикалық панельдерді жазылады. MPs жарты автоматты түрде құрылған және CLiMP жарлықтарымен адамдардың келісімі 95, 8%. Біз CLiMP және n-граммаларды, LSTMs және қытайша BERT және 11 түрлі LMs дегенді бағаладық. Біз классификациялық атаулық келіс пен вербалдық қосымша таңдау - үлгілер әдетте ең жақсы істейтін пайдаланулар. Бірақ үлгілер бар құрылғылар, байланыстар және толтыру тәуелдіктерімен ең көбірек күреседі. Жалпы, Қытай BERT орташа дұрыс 81,8% деп жеткізеді, бірақ LSTMs және 5 грамм жұмыс істемелері тек жалпы деңгейінде жоғары.', 'hu': 'A nyelvi modellek nyelvtanilag tájékozott elemzése hozzájárul az ilyen modellek megértéséhez és fejlesztéséhez. Itt bemutatjuk a kínai nyelvi minimálpárok korpuszát (CLiMP), hogy megvizsgáljuk, milyen ismereteket szereznek a kínai LM-ek. A CLiMP 1000 minimális párból áll, amelyek 16 szintaktikus kontrasztot tartalmaznak kínaiul, 9 fő kínai nyelvi jelenséget fednek fel. Az MPs félautomatikusan generálódik, és az emberi egyetértés a CLiMP címkéivel 95,8%. 11 különböző LM-t értékelünk CLiMP-en, amelyek n-grammokat, LSTM-eket és kínai BERT-eket fednek fel. Úgy találjuk, hogy az osztályozó-főnév megállapodás és az ige kiegészítő kiválasztás azok a jelenségek, amelyekben a modellek általában a legjobban teljesítenek. Azonban a modellek küzdenek leginkább a ba konstrukcióval, kötéssel és töltőrés függőségekkel. Összességében a kínai BERT 81,8%-os átlagos pontosságot ér el, míg az LSTMs és az 5 gramm teljesítménye csak mérsékelten haladja meg a véletlen szintet.', 'lt': 'Linguistically informed analyses of language models (LMs) contribute to the understanding and improvement of such models.  Čia pristatome Kinijos kalbinių minimalių porų korpusą (CLiMP), kad ištirtume, kokių žinių Kinijos LM įgyja. CLiMP sudarytas iš 1000 minimalių porų (MPs) rinkinių 16 sintaksinių kontrastų kinų kalba, apimančių 9 pagrindinius kinų kalbinius reiškinius. MPs gaminami pusiau automatiškai, o žmonės sutinka su CLiMP etiketėmis 95,8 %. Vertiname 11 skirtingų CLiMP LM, apimančių n-gramus, LSTM ir Kinijos BERT. Nustatome, kad klasifikatorių pavadinimų susitarimas ir žodžių papildymo atranka yra reiškiniai, kuriuos modeliai paprastai geriausiai veikia. Vis dėlto modeliai labiausiai susiduria su bazinės konstrukcijos, įpareigojimo ir užpildymo atotrūkių priklausomybe. Apskritai Kinijos BERT pasiekia vidutinį tikslumą 81,8 %, o LSTM ir 5 gramų eksploatacijos yra tik vidutiniškai didesnės už atsitiktinį lygį.', 'ms': 'Analisis model bahasa yang diberitahu secara bahasa (LMs) berkontribusi kepada pemahaman dan peningkatan model tersebut. Di sini, kami memperkenalkan korpus pasangan bahasa China minimal (CLiMP) untuk menyelidiki apa pengetahuan LMs Cina mendapatkan. CLiMP terdiri dari set 1000 pasangan minimal (MPs) untuk 16 kontras sintaktik dalam bahasa Cina, meliputi 9 fenomena bahasa Cina utama. MPs dijana setengah-automatik, dan persetujuan manusia dengan label dalam CLiMP adalah 95.8%. Kami menilai 11 LMs berbeza pada CLiMP, meliputi n-gram, LSTM, dan BERT Cina. Kami mendapati bahawa persetujuan-nama klasifikasi dan pemilihan tambahan verb adalah fenomena yang model biasanya melakukan yang terbaik. Namun, model paling berjuang dengan bangunan ba, pengikatan, dan dependensi penuh-ruang. Secara keseluruhan, BERT Cina mencapai ketepatan rata-rata 81.8%, sementara prestasi LSTM dan 5-gram hanya secara sederhana di atas aras peluang.', 'mt': 'Analiżijiet infurmati lingwistikament ta’ mudelli lingwistiċi (LMs) jikkontribwixxu għall-fehim u t-titjib ta’ mudelli bħal dawn. Hawnhekk, nintroduċu l-korpus ta’ pari minimi lingwistiċi Ċiniżi (CLiMP) biex ninvestigaw x’għarfien jiksbu l-LMs Ċiniżi. CLiMP consists of sets of 1000 minimal pairs (MPs) for 16 syntactic contrasts in Chinese, covering 9 major Chinese linguistic phenomena.  Il-MPs huma ġenerati semiawtomatikament, u l-qbil tal-bniedem mat-tikketti f’CLiMP huwa ta’ 95.8%. Aħna jevalwaw 11-il LMs differenti fuq CLiMP, li jkopru n-grammi, LSTMs, u BERT Ċiniż. Aħna nsibu li l-ftehim dwar il-klassifikatur u l-għażla tal-kumplimenti tal-verb huma l-fenomeni li l-mudelli ġeneralment iwettqu l-aħjar. Madankollu, il-mudelli għandhom l-aktar diffikultajiet bil-kostruzzjoni tal-ba, l-irbit u d-dipendenzi tal-filler-gap. B’mod ġenerali, il-BERT Ċiniż jikseb preċiżjoni medja ta’ 81.8%, filwaqt li l-prestazzjonijiet ta’ LSTMs u 5-grammi huma biss moderatament ogħla mil-livell ta’ ċans.', 'mk': 'Лингвистички информираните анализи на јазичките модели (LMs) придонесуваат за разбирање и подобрување на ваквите модели. Тука, го претставуваме корпусот на кинеските лингвистички минимални парови (CLiMP) за да истражиме што знаење кинеските LMs добиваат. CLiMP се состои од групи од 1000 минимални парови (пратеници) за 16 синтактички контрасти на кинески, кои покриваат 9 главни кинески јазички феномени. Пратениците се полуавтоматски генерирани, а човечкиот договор со етикетите во CLiMP е 95,8 отсто. Ги проценуваме 11 различни LMs на CLiMP, покривајќи n-грами, LSTM и Кинески BERT. We find that classifier-noun agreement and verb complement selection are the phenomena that models generally perform best at.  Сепак, моделите се борат најмногу со изградбата на бата, врзувањето и зависностите од пополнување. Вкупно, Кинескиот БЕРТ постигнува просечна точност од 81,8 отсто, додека изведувањата на ЛСТМ и 5 грами се само модерно над нивото на шансата.', 'ml': 'ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളുടെ (LMs) ലിന്\u200dഗ്വിസ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d വിവരമറിയിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഇങ്ങനെ മോഡലുകളുടെ ബുദ്ധിമുന്ന ഇവിടെ, ചൈനീസ് ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിനെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് ചൈനീസ് എല്\u200dമിസ് എന്താണ് ലഭിക്കുന്നതെന്ന് അന്വേഷിക്ക CLiMP consists of sets of 1000 minimal pairs (MPs) for 16 syntactic contrasts in Chinese, covering 9 major Chinese linguistic phenomena.  സിലിമ്പിലെ ലേബലുകളുമായി പെമ്പുകള്\u200d സ്വയം സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. 95.8%. നമ്മള്\u200d സിലിമ്പില്\u200d 11 വ്യത്യസ്ത എല്\u200dമിസിനെ വിലയിച്ച് വിലയിക്കുന്നു, n-grams, LSTMs, ചൈനീസ് ബെര്\u200dട്ടി. നമ്മള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നത് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കര്\u200d നൂന്\u200d കരാരും വാര്\u200dബ് പ്രധാന തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതും സാധാരണ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്ത എങ്കിലും മോഡലുകള്\u200d ബാ നിര്\u200dമ്മാണം, ബന്ധിക്കുന്നത്, പിന്നെ നിറയ്ക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ആശ്രയം കൊണ്ട് ഏറ്റവും മികച്ച പ മൊത്തം ചൈനീസ് ബെര്\u200dട്ടി ഒരു 81. 8% ശരാശരി കൃത്യമായി പ്രാപിക്കുന്നു. LSTMs. 5 ഗ്രാമിന്റെ പ്രദര്\u200dശനങ്ങള്\u200d സാധാരണ നിലയില്\u200d മാത്രമേ ഉള', 'no': 'Linguistically informerte analyser av språk-modeller (LMs) bidrar til forståelse og forbetringa av slike modeller. Her introduserer vi korpusen av kinesiske lingviske minimale parr (CLiMP) for å undersøke kva kjenning kinesiske LMs kjenner. CLiMP består av sett av 1000 minimal par (MPs) for 16 syntaktiske kontrast i kinesisk, som dekkar 9 stor kinesisk språk-fenomen. MPs er halvautomatisk generert, og menneskelig avtale med etikettene i CLiMP er 95,8%. Vi evaluerer 11 ulike LMs på CLiMP, dekker n-gramer, LSTMs og kinesisk BERT. Vi finn at klassifiserende og verbkomplementutvalet er fenomenane som modeller gjeld vanlegvis best på. Men modeller strømmer det meste med ba-konstruksjonen, bindinga og fylleravhengigheten. Gjennomsnittlig, kinesisk BERT oppnår eit gjennomsnittlig nøyaktig 81,8 %, mens utføringane av LSTMs og 5-gram er berre gjennomsnittlig over sannsnivå.', 'mn': 'Тийм загваруудыг ойлгох болон сайжруулах боломжтой болгодог. Энд бид Хятад хэлний хамгийн бага хэмжээний корпус (CLiMP) хоёрыг тайлбарлаж, Хятад LMs ямар мэдлэг авдаг талаар судалж өгдөг. CLiMP нь Хятадын 16 синтактикийн ялгаатай 1000 жижиг хоёр (MPs) байдаг. Энэ нь 9 том Хятадын хэлний үзэгдэл юм. MPs нь хагас автоматаар үүсгэсэн бөгөөд хүн төрөлхтний шинжилгээ CLiMP-д 95.8%-тай тэмдэглэгддэг. Бид CLiMP дээр 11 өөр LMs-г дүгнэж, n-грамм, LSTMs, Хятад BERT-г дүгнэж байна. Бид хэлбэрийн нэр тохиолдол болон үгийн нэмэлт сонголт нь загваруудын ерөнхийдөө хамгийн сайн үйл явдал юм. Гэхдээ загварууд баны барилга, холбоотой, дүүрэн зай хамааралтай хамгийн их тэмцдэг. Үнэндээ Хятад БЕРТ дундаж тодорхойлолт 81.8% гардаг. Гэхдээ LSTMs болон 5 грамм нь зөвхөн боломжтой түвшинд дундаж байдаг.', 'pl': 'Uświadomione językowo analizy modeli językowych (LM) przyczyniają się do zrozumienia i doskonalenia tych modeli. W tym miejscu przedstawiamy korpus chińskich minimalnych par lingwistycznych (CLiMP), aby zbadać, jaką wiedzę zdobywają chińskie LM. CLiMP składa się z zestawów 1000 par minimalnych (MP) dla 16 kontrastów składni w języku chińskim, obejmujących dziewięć głównych chińskich zjawisk językowych. MPs są generowane półautomatycznie, a zgodność człowieka z etykietami w CLiMP wynosi 95,8%. Oceniamy 11 różnych LM na CLiMP, obejmujących n-gramy, LSTMs i chiński BERT. Odkrywamy, że zgodność rzeczownika klasyfikacyjnego i dobór uzupełnienia czasownika są zjawiskami, w których modele generalnie sprawdzają się najlepiej. Jednak modele najbardziej borykają się z zależnościami konstrukcji, wiązania i luki wypełniającej. Ogólnie rzecz biorąc, chiński BERT osiąga średnią dokładność 81,8% podczas gdy wydajność LSTMów i 5-gramów jest umiarkowanie ponad poziomem szans.', 'so': 'Shaqooyinka luuqada lagu ogeysiiyey qoraalka luuqada (LMs) wuxuu ku faa’iidaa garashada iyo hagitaanka modelladan oo kale. Halkan, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qofka luqada Shiino ee ugu yaraan (CLiMP) si aan u baaritaanno aqoonta ay u helaan Ms. Luqada Shiino. CLiMP waxaa ka mid ah tusaale labo oo ugu yaraan (MP) oo ku qoran 16 kooxahooda oo ku qoran afka Shiino ee ugu weyn. Baarlamaanka waxaa loo sameeyaa si bilow ah, oo heshiiska dadkuna waa 95,8%. Waxaan qiimeynaynaa 11 Ms. oo kala duduwan CLiMP, kaasoo ku qoran n-gram, LSTMs, iyo Chinese BERT. We find that classifier-noun agreement and verb complement selection are the phenomena that models generally perform best at.  Si kastaba ha ahaatee tusaalooyinku waxay ugu badnaan la dagaalamayaan dhismaha baarka, xidhiidhka iyo buuxinta ay ku xiran tahay mid ku xiran. Sida caadiga ah Shiinaha BERT wuxuu gaadhaa saxda qiyaas ah 81.8 boqolkiiba, xitaa sameynta LSTMs iyo 5 gram ayaa ka sarreeya heerka suurtagalka.', 'sv': 'Språkligt informerade analyser av språkmodeller bidrar till förståelse och förbättring av sådana modeller. Här introducerar vi korpusen av kinesiska språkliga minimala par (CLiMP) för att undersöka vilken kunskap kinesiska LM förvärvar. CLiMP består av uppsättningar om 1000 minimala par (MP) för 16 syntaktiska kontraster på kinesiska, som täcker 9 större kinesiska språkfenomen. MP genereras halvautomatiskt och mänsklig överenskommelse med etiketterna i CLiMP är 95,8%. Vi utvärderar 11 olika LM på CLiMP, som täcker n-gram, LSTMs och kinesisk BERT. Vi finner att klassificerare-substantiv överenskommelse och verbkomplementval är de fenomen som modellerna generellt presterar bäst på. Modellerna kämpar dock mest med beroendena ba konstruktion, bindning och fyllnadsgap. Totalt sett uppnår kinesisk BERT en genomsnittlig noggrannhet på 81,8%, medan prestandan för LSTMs och 5 gram bara ligger måttligt över chansnivån.', 'sr': 'Lingistički informirane analize jezičkih modela (LMs) doprinose razumijevanju i poboljšanju takvih modela. Ovde predstavljamo korpus kineskih minimalnih parova (CLiMP) da istražujemo šta znaju kineske LMs. CLiMP se sastoji od seta 1000 minimalnih parova (MPs) za 16 sintaktičnih kontrasta na kineskom Kineskom, pokrivajući 9 glavnih kineskih jezičkih fenomena. MPs su polu-automatski proizvedeni, a ljudski sporazum sa etiketama u CLiMP je 95,8%. Procjenjujemo 11 različitih LMs na CLiMP, pokrivajući n-grame, LSTMs i kineske BERT. Nalazimo da su klasifikatorski imenski sporazum i izbor dodataka verba fenomeni u kojima se modeli najbolje izvršavaju. Međutim, modeli se najviše bore sa izgradnjom, vezanjem i zavisnošću punjenja praznina. Nakon svega, kineski BERT postiže prosječnu tačnost 81,8%, dok su izvodima LSTMs i 5 grama samo umjereno iznad nivoa šanse.', 'ro': 'Analizele lingvistice informate ale modelelor lingvistice (LM) contribuie la înțelegerea și îmbunătățirea acestor modele. Aici, introducem corpul de perechi lingvistice minime chineze (CLiMP) pentru a investiga ce cunoștințe dobândesc LM-urile chineze. CLiMP constă din seturi de 1000 de perechi minime (MP) pentru 16 contraste sintactice în chineză, acoperind 9 fenomene lingvistice chineze majore. MP-urile sunt generate semi-automat, iar acordul uman cu etichetele din CLiMP este de 95,8%. Evaluăm 11 LM diferite pe CLiMP, acoperind n-grame, LSTMs și BERT chinezesc. Considerăm că acordul clasificator-substantiv și selecția complementului verbelor sunt fenomenele la care modelele performează cel mai bine. Cu toate acestea, modelele se luptă cel mai mult cu dependențele ba de construcție, legare și umplere-gap. În general, BERT chinezesc atinge o acuratețe medie de 81,8%, în timp ce performanțele LSTMs și 5 grame sunt doar moderat peste nivelul șanselor.', 'ta': 'மொழி மாதிரிகள் (LMs) புரிந்து அறிவிப்பு அறிவிப்பு ஆராய்ச்சிகள் இவ்வாறு மாதிரிகளின் புரிவு மற்றும் மேம இங்கே நாம் சீன மொழியில் குறைந்தபட்ச ஜோடி (CLiMP) குறைந்தபட்ச அறிவு சீனா LMs என்ன கிடைக்கும் என்பதை அறிவிக்க வேண்டும். 16 சீனாவில் ஒத்திசைப்பு மாறுபாடுகளுக்காக சிலிஎம்ப் குறைந்தபட்ச ஜோடிகள் (MPs) சேர்க்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, 9 முக்கிய சீனா மொழிமா பாதி தானாகவே உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, சிலிம்பில் உள்ள சிட்டைகளுடன் மனித ஒப்பந்தம் 95. 8%. We evaluate 11 different LMs on CLiMP, covering n-grams, LSTMs, and Chinese BERT.  வகுப்பாளர் நூன் ஒப்பந்தம் மற்றும் வார்ப் சிக்கல் தேர்வு என்பதை நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம் மாதிரிகள் பொதுவாக செ ஆனால், மாதிரிகள் பா கட்டமைப்பு, பிணைப்பு, மற்றும் நிரப்பும் இடைவெளி சார்புகளை மிக போராடுகிறார்கள். மொத்தமாக, சீனம் பெர்ட் ஒரு 81. 8% சராசரி சரியாக பெறுகிறது, LSTMs மற்றும் 5- கிராம்களின் செயல்பாடுகள் வாய்ப்பு நிலையில் மட்டும் நடு', 'ur': 'زبان نمڈلوں (LMs) کے ذریعے زبان کی تحقیقات کے ذریعے اس طرح کی نمڈلوں کی سمجھ اور تحقیقات کے ذریعے اضافہ کرتے ہیں. یہاں، ہم چینی زبان کی کمترین جوڑوں کی کورپوس کو معرفی کرتے ہیں کہ چینی لام کس علم حاصل کریں۔ CLiMP میں 16 سینٹکتیک کنٹرسیٹ کے لئے 1000 کم جوڑے (MPs) کے ساتھ موجود ہوتے ہیں، 9 بڑے چینی زبان شناسی فائدے پر پورے ہوتے ہیں۔ MPs are half-automatic generated, and human agreement with the labels in CLiMP is 95.8%. ہم CLiMP پر 11 مختلف LMs کا ارزش کرتے ہیں، n-grams، LSTMs، اور چینی BERT پر. ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ کلیسپیر نام کا معاملہ اور کلیسپیر جمع کرنے کا انتخاب یہ ہے کہ مدلکوں کے معاملہ میں بہترین عمل کرتے ہیں. لیکن موڈل باہ بنیاد، بینڈی، اور فائدہ فائدہ پر سب سے زیادہ مشکل کرتے ہیں. بالکل، چینی BERT ایک متوسط دقیق 81.8% تک پہنچتا ہے، حالانکہ LSTMs اور 5-گرم کے نمائش صرف موقعیت سطح پر متوسط ہیں.', 'si': 'භාෂාව මොඩේල්ස් ගැන ලින්ග්\u200dරිස්ටිකියෙන් විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා විශ්ලේෂණය (LMs) වලින් මොඩේල්ස් ගැන තේ මෙන්න, අපි චීනි භාෂාවිකාශික ප්\u200dරමාණය (CLiMP) කොර්පූස් විදිහට පරීක්ෂා කරන්න චීනි LMs ගැන දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරශ CLiMP එක්ක ප්\u200dරධාන චීනි භාෂාවික විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරමය 16 සඳහා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරමය 1000 (MPs) සම්බන්ධයක් තියෙනවා. MPs ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙනවා, ඒ වගේම CLiMP වල ලේබල් එක්ක මිනිස්සු එකඟ අපි CLiMP වලින් වෙනස් LMs 11 විශ්වාස කරනවා, n-Grams, LSTMs, සහ චීනි BERT වලින්. අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාසිකරණය සහ වාර්තාව සම්පූර්ණය තෝරාගන්න පුළුවන් සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට නමුත්, මොඩේල්ස් බා නිර්මාණය, බායින්ඩ් එක්ක, සහ පුරුද්ධ විශේෂතාවක් සමඟ හැකියා. සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම, චීනී BERT සමාන්\u200dය 81.8% සාමාන්\u200dය සිද්ධතාවක් ලැබෙනවා, LSTMs සහ 5-ග්\u200dරෑම්ස්ග්\u200dරෑම් වලින් අවස්ථාවක්', 'uz': "Tilning modellari (LMs) haqida maʼlumot tarjima qilingan tilni o'rganish va o'zgarishga yordam beradi. Bu yerda, biz Xitoycha LMs nima olishni qidirish uchun xitoycha tillar (CLiMP) har xitoycha xitoycha xitoblar (CLiMP) qoidasini anglatamiz. CLiMP consists of sets of 1000 minimal pairs (MPs) for 16 syntactic contrasts in Chinese, covering 9 major Chinese linguistic phenomena.  Парламент аъзолари автоматик тарқатилади ва CLiMP да одамлар аҳамияти 95.8%. Biz CLiMPda 11 boshqa LMs qiymatimiz, n-gram, LSTMs, Xitoycha BERT bilan qiymatmiz. Biz o'ylaymiz, nashfiy soʻzni va verb tuzilishini o'zgartiradik, modellar umumiy narsa bilan bajaradigan holat. Lekin, modellar ba'ning ko'pchiligi quyidagi, bog'lash, va butun gap qoidalari bilan harakat qiladi. Umumiy, Xitoycha BERT oddiy oddiylikga 81.8% keladi, ammo LSTMs va 5 gram bajarishlari faqat oddiy darajadan foydalanadi.", 'vi': 'Các phân tích ngôn ngữ học được thông tin góp phần vào sự hiểu biết và cải thiện các mô hình này. Ở đây, chúng tôi giới thiệu tập đoàn các cặp ngôn ngữ Trung Quốc ít nhất (GISIMP) để điều tra hiểu biết của LM Trung Quốc. [Tiếng Trung Quốc] Các nhóm các cặp ảnh tối thiểu của 1000 (Nghị sĩ) cho mối tương phản pháp 16, bao gồm chín hiện tượng ngôn ngữ Trung Quốc quan trọng. Các thành viên Quốc hội được sản xuất gần tự động, và thỏa thuận con người với nhãn trong SILMP là 95.8 Name Chúng tôi đánh giá loại LM khác nhau trên SILIMP, bao gồm n-grams, LSD, và BERT Trung Quốc. Chúng tôi thấy hợp đồng phân loại danh từ và phần bổ nhiệm động từ là những hiện tượng mà các mô- đun thường làm tốt nhất. Tuy nhiên, các mô hình đấu tranh nhiều nhất với việc xây dựng, ràng buộc, và các mối quan hệ khác nhau. Nói chung, BERT Trung Quốc đạt đến độ chính xác trung bình 81.8, trong khi trình diễn của LSTM và 5-gram chỉ vượt qua mức ngẫu nhiên.', 'bg': 'Лингвистично информираните анализи на езиковите модели допринасят за разбирането и усъвършенстването на такива модели. Тук представяме корпуса от китайски лингвистични минимални двойки (за да проучим какви знания китайските ЛМ придобиват. CLiMP се състои от набори от 1000 минимални двойки (МП) за 16 синтактични контраста на китайски, обхващащи 9 основни китайски езикови явления. МП се генерират полуавтоматично, а човешкото съгласие с етикетите в CLiMP е 95.8%. Ние оценяваме 11 различни LM на CLiMP, обхващащи n-грама, ЛСТМ и китайски BERT. Установяваме, че съгласието класификатор-съществително и изборът на глаголно допълване са феномените, при които моделите обикновено се представят най-добре. Въпреки това, моделите се борят най-много с зависимостите за изграждане, свързване и запълване на празнина. Като цяло китайският БЕРТ постига средна точност 81,8%, докато представянето на ЛТМ и 5 грама са само умерено над случайното ниво.', 'hr': 'Lingistički informirane analize jezičkih modela (LMs) doprinose razumijevanju i poboljšanju takvih modela. Ovdje predstavljamo korpus kineskih minimalnih lingvističkih parova (CLiMP) kako bi istražili koje znanje kineskih LMs-a dobila. CLiMP se sastoji od seta od 1000 minimalnih parova (MPs) za 16 sintaktičnih kontrasta na kineskom Kineskom, pokrivajući 9 glavnih kineskih jezičkih fenomena. MPs su polu-automatski proizvedeni, a ljudski sporazum s etiketama u CLiMP je 95,8%. Procjenjujemo 11 različitih LMs na CLiMP, pokrivajući n-grame, LSTMs i kineske BERT. Mi smatramo da su klasifikatorski imenski sporazum i izbor dodataka verba fenomeni u kojima se modeli uopće najbolje izvršavaju. Međutim, modeli se najviše bore sa izgradnjom, vezanjem i zavisnošću punjenja praznina. Nakon svega, kineski BERT postiže prosječnu preciznost 81,8%, dok su učinkovi LSTMs i 5 grama samo umjereno iznad razine šanse.', 'nl': "Taalkundig onderbouwde analyses van taalmodellen (LM's) dragen bij aan het begrijpen en verbeteren van dergelijke modellen. Hier introduceren we het corpus van Chinese linguïstische minimale paren (CLiMP) om te onderzoeken welke kennis Chinese LMs verwerven. CLiMP bestaat uit sets van 1000 minimale paren (MP's) voor 16 syntactische contrasten in het Chinees, die negen belangrijke Chinese linguïstische fenomenen bestrijken. De MP's worden semi-automatisch gegenereerd en de menselijke overeenstemming met de labels in CLiMP is 95,8%. We evalueren elf verschillende LMs op CLiMP, met betrekking tot n-gram, LSTMs en Chinese BERT. We vinden dat classificator-zelfstandig naamwoord overeenkomst en werkwoordopplement selectie de verschijnselen zijn waar modellen over het algemeen het beste in presteren. Modellen worstelen echter het meest met de ba constructie, binding en filler-gap afhankelijkheden. Over het algemeen bereikt Chinese BERT een 81,8% gemiddelde nauwkeurigheid, terwijl de prestaties van LSTMs en 5-gram slechts matig boven het kansniveau liggen.", 'da': "Sprogorienterede analyser af sprogmodeller bidrager til forståelsen og forbedringen af sådanne modeller. Her introducerer vi korpusset af kinesiske sproglige minimale par (CLiMP) for at undersøge, hvilken viden kinesiske LM'er erhverver. CLiMP består af sæt på 1000 minimale par (MP) for 16 syntaktiske kontraster på kinesisk, der dækker 9 store kinesiske sproglige fænomener. MP'erne genereres semi-automatisk, og menneskelig enighed med etiketterne i CLiMP er 95,8%. Vi evaluerer 11 forskellige LM'er på CLiMP, der dækker n-gram, LSTMs og kinesisk BERT. Vi finder ud af, at klassifikation-substantiv aftale og udvalg af verbkomplement er de fænomener, modellerne generelt fungerer bedst til. Modellerne kæmper dog mest med ba konstruktion, binding og filler-gap afhængigheder. Samlet set opnår kinesisk BERT en gennemsnitlig nøjagtighed på 81,8%, mens præstationerne af LSTMs og 5 gram kun ligger moderat over chanceniveauet.", 'ko': '언어 모델의 언어학 정보 분석은 이런 모델을 이해하고 개선하는 데 도움이 된다.여기서 우리는 중국어 언어의 최소 대조 자료 라이브러리(CliMP)를 도입하여 중국어 언어의 최소 대조에서 얻은 지식을 연구한다.CliMP는 1000쌍의 최소 쌍(MPS)으로 구성되어 있으며 16가지 중국어 문법 대비에 사용되며 9가지 주요 중국어 언어 현상을 포함한다.MPs는 반자동적으로 생성된 것으로 인공과 CliMP의 라벨의 일치성은 95.8%이다.우리는 CliMP에서 n-gram, LSTM과 중국 BERT를 포함한 11가지 다른 LMs를 평가했다.우리는 분류기-명사 일치성과 동사-보어 선택이 모델이 통상적으로 가장 잘 표현되는 현상이라는 것을 발견했다.그러나 모델은 b구조, 귀속과 충전 간극 의존 관계를 가장 처리하기 어렵다.전체적으로 중국의 BERT 평균 정확도는 81.8%였고 LSTM과 5-GRAM의 활약은 기회 수준보다 약간 높았다.', 'de': 'Sprachlich fundierte Analysen von Sprachmodellen (LMs) tragen zum Verständnis und zur Verbesserung solcher Modelle bei. Hier stellen wir den Korpus chinesischer linguistischer Minimalpaare (CLiMP) vor, um zu untersuchen, welches Wissen chinesische LMs erwerben. CLiMP besteht aus Sätzen von 1000-Minimalpaaren (MPs) für 16-syntaktische Kontraste im Chinesischen, die neun wichtige chinesische linguistische Phänomene abdecken. Die MPs werden halbautomatisch generiert, und die menschliche Übereinstimmung mit den Labels in CLiMP beträgt 95,8%. Wir evaluieren elf verschiedene LMs auf CLiMP, die n-Gramm, LSTMs und chinesisches BERT abdecken. Wir finden, dass Klassifikator-Substantiv-Übereinstimmung und Verb-Komplementauswahl die Phänomene sind, bei denen Modelle im Allgemeinen am besten funktionieren. Am meisten kämpfen Modelle jedoch mit den Abhängigkeiten von ba Konstruktion, Bindung und Fülllücke. Insgesamt erreicht das chinesische BERT eine 81,8% durchschnittliche Genauigkeit, während die Leistungen von LSTMs und 5-Gramm nur mäßig über dem Zufallsniveau liegen.', 'id': 'Linguistically informed analyses of language models (LMs) contribute to the understanding and improvement of such models.  Di sini, kami memperkenalkan corpus dari pasangan bahasa Cina minimal (CLiMP) untuk menyelidiki apa pengetahuan LMs Cina mendapatkan. CLiMP terdiri dari set dari 1000 pasangan minimal (MPs) untuk 16 kontras sintaksi di Cina, meliputi 9 fenomena bahasa Cina utama. MPs semi-otomatis dihasilkan, dan kesepakatan manusia dengan label di CLiMP adalah 95,8%. Kami mengevaluasi 11 LM berbeda di CLiMP, meliputi n-gram, LSTM, dan BERT Cina. Kami menemukan bahwa kesepakatan klasifikasi-nama dan seleksi komplimen verb adalah fenomena yang biasanya model melakukan yang terbaik. However, models struggle the most with the ba construction, binding, and filler-gap dependencies.  Overall, Chinese BERT achieves an 81.8% average accuracy, while the performances of LSTMs and 5-grams are only moderately above chance level.', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa lugha unaofahamika kwa lugha (LMs) unachangia kuelewa na kuboreshwa kwa mifano hiyo. Here, we introduce the corpus of Chinese linguistic minimal pairs (CLiMP) to investigate what knowledge Chinese LMs acquire.  CLiMP ina seti ya wanandoa wa chini 1,000 (wabunge) kwa ajili ya mgogoro wa 16 wa ushirikiano nchini China, inayohusu hali 9 kubwa ya lugha za Kichina. Wabunge wanatengenezwa kwa mara mbili, na makubaliano ya binadamu na mabango ya CLiMP ni asilimia 95.8. Tutathmini Biblia 11 tofauti kwenye CLiMP, tukiandika vipande vya vipindi vya habari, LSTMs, na China BERT. Tunapata makubaliano yasiyo na msingi na uchaguzi wa maneno ni mambo ambayo mifano kwa ujumla hufanya vizuri. However, models struggle the most with the ba construction, binding, and filler-gap dependencies.  Kwa ujumla, BERT wa China inapata kiwango cha wastani cha 81.8, wakati matumizi ya LSTMs na gram 5 ni ya kisasa zaidi ya kiwango cha nafasi.', 'fa': 'تحلیل\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی\u200cهای مدل\u200cهای زبان (LMs) به درک و بهبود این مدل\u200cها کمک می\u200cکنند. اینجا، ما کورپوس جفت\u200cهای minimalist زبان چینی را معرفی می\u200cکنیم تا تحقیق کنیم که دانش چینی LMs دریافت می\u200cکنند. CLiMP consists of 1000 minimal pairs (MPs) for 16 syntactic contrasts in Chinese, covering 9 major Chinese linguistic phenomena. MPs are semi-automatic generated, and human agreement with the labels in CLiMP is 95.8%. ما ۱۱ LMs متفاوت را در CLiMP ارزیابی می کنیم، n-grams، LSTMs و BERT چینی را پوشاندیم. ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که توافق نام\u200cهای مخفی\u200cتر و انتخاب توافق کلمه\u200cها پدیده\u200cهایی هستند که مدل\u200cها عموماً بهترین انجام می\u200cدهند. با این حال، مدل\u200cها با ساختن، پیوند\u200cبندی و بستگی\u200cهای فاصله\u200cهای پر\u200cکننده\u200cترین مبارزه می\u200cکنند. در کل، برت چینی\u200cها دقیق متوسط 81.8 درصد را دریافت می\u200cکنند، در حالی که اجرای LSTMs و 5 گرم\u200cها فقط در متوسط بالاتر از سطح شانس هستند.', 'af': "Linguistically informed analyses of taal modele (LMs) bydra aan die verstanding en verbetering van sodanige modele. Hier, ons introduseer die korpus van Sjinese lingwisiese minimale paar (CLiMP) om te ondersoek wat kennis Sjinese LMs kry. CLiMP bestaan van stelle van 1000 minimale paar (MPs) vir 16 sintaktiese kontraste in Sjinees, wat 9 grootste Sjinese lingwisiese fenomene oordek. Die MPs is semi-automaties genereer, en menslike ooreenkoms met die etikette in CLiMP is 95.8%. Ons evalueer 11 verskillende LMs op CLiMP, bedek n-grame, LSTMs en Sjinese BERT. Ons vind dat klassifiseerder-noun ooreenkoms en verb-komplementkeuse is die fenomene waarop modele algemeen beste uitvoer. Maar, modele struikel die mees met die ba-konstruksie, binding en afhanklikhede van afhanklikhede. Oorsaaklik, Sjinese BERT bereik 'n gemiddelde presisie 81,8 % toe die uitvoerings van LSTMs en 5-grame is net middels bo kans vlak.", 'am': 'ቋንቋዎች ምሳሌዎች (LMs) ለዚህ ዓይነቶች ማስተዋል እና ማሻሻሻል የሚጠቅምበት ቋንቋ አስተያየት ነው፡፡ Here, we introduce the corpus of Chinese linguistic minimal pairs (CLiMP) to investigate what knowledge Chinese LMs acquire.  CLiMP በቻይና ለ16 የቻይና ተቃውሞ የተመሳሳይ የቻይና ቋንቋዊ ቋንቋ አካባቢዎች በ1000 ትንሽ ዓይነቶች (ፓርላማ) የሚቆጠሩ ናቸው፡፡ የፓርላማውያን ፓርላማዎች በክሊፕ ካለው ካላት ጋር እየተሰናከሉ 95.8 በመቶ ነው፡፡ ከ-ግራም፣ LSTMs እና ቻይና BERT የሚሸፍን የCLiMP ላይ 11 የተለየ የኢንተርኔት አዋቂዎች እናደርጋለን፡፡ አካባቢ ስህተት እና የቋንቋ ምርጫው ምሳሌዎች በመጠቀም የሚሞከሩበት ነገር ነው ብለን እናገኛለን፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ ሞዴሎቹ የባ ሕንጻ፣ ታስር፣ የሞላው ክፍል ተደጋፊዎች ይጋደላሉ፡፡ በጠቅላላ፣ ቻይናውያን ቢERT በዕድሜው 81.8 በመቶ እርግጠኛ ትክክል ያገኛል፤ የLSTMs እና 5 ግራም የደረጃ ውጤቶች በቁጥጥር ላይ ብቻ ናቸው፡፡', 'sq': 'Linguistically informed analyses of language models (LMs) contribute to the understanding and improvement of such models.  Here, we introduce the corpus of Chinese linguistic minimal pairs (CLiMP) to investigate what knowledge Chinese LMs acquire.  CLiMP përbëhet nga grupe prej 1000 çiftesh minimal ë (MPs) për 16 kontraste sintaktike në kinez, duke mbuluar 9 fenomene të mëdha gjuhësore kineze. MPs janë gjysmë-automatikisht të gjeneruar dhe marrëveshja njerëzore me etiketat në CLiMP është 95.8%. Ne vlerësojmë 11 LMs të ndryshme n ë CLiMP, duke mbuluar n-gram, LSTM dhe BERT kinez. Ne zbulojmë se marrëveshja klasifikues-emër dhe zgjedhja e verbeve komplementare janë fenomenet në të cilat modelet përgjithësisht kryejnë më mirë. Megjithatë, modelet luftojnë më së shumti me ndërtimin e ba, lidhjen dhe varësinë e mbushjes. Overall, Chinese BERT achieves an 81.8% average accuracy, while the performances of LSTMs and 5-grams are only moderately above chance level.', 'az': 'Dil modellərinin (LMs) dillərinin analizi bu modellərin anlaşılmasına və düzəltməsinə kömək edir. Burada Çin dilində olanların nəyi biləcəyini soruşmaq üçün Cənnət dilində olan minimal çiftlərin corpusunu tanıdırıq. CLiMP Çincə 16 sintaktik müqayisədə 1000 minimal çift (MPs) toplamıdır, 9 böyük Çincə dil parçalarını örtür. MPs yarı-avtomatik ürəklənir və CLiMP etiketlərində insan anlaşması 95,8%-dir. Biz CLiMP ilə 11 fərqli LMs değerlendiririk, n-gramları, LSTMs və Çin BERT-ları örtürük. Biz klassifikat adlı anlaşma və verb tamamlama seçməsi modellərin genellikle ən yaxşı işlədiklərini görürük. Ancaq modellər ba inşaatı, ba ğlılığı və boşluq bağlılıqları ilə ən çox müharibə edirlər. Həqiqətən, Çin BERT ortalama doğruluğu 81,8%-ə nail ola bilər, lakin LSTMs və 5-gramların performansları ancaq mümkün səviyyədən çox yüksəkdir.', 'bn': 'Linguistically informed analyses of language models (LMs) contribute to the understanding and improvement of such models.  এখানে আমরা চীনা ভাষার ন্যুনতম জোড়া (সিলিএমপি) কোর্পাস পরিচয় করিয়ে দেখাচ্ছি চীনা এলএমএস কি জ্ঞান পেয়েছে তা তদন্ত করতে। চীনের ১৬টি সিন্ট্যাক্টিক বিরোধীতার জন্য সিলিএমপির মধ্যে ১০০০ ন্যুনতম জোড়া (এমপি) সেট রয়েছে, যারা ৯টি প্রধান চীনা ভাষার ব সংসদ স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে তৈরি হয়েছে এবং সিলিএমপির লেবেলের সাথে মানুষের চুক্তি ৯৫.৮%। আমরা সিলিএমপিতে ১১টি ভিন্ন এলমিসকে মূল্য দিচ্ছি, যারা এন-গ্রাম, এলসিএমএস এবং চীনা বার্টির উপর কাভার করেছে। We find that classifier-noun agreement and verb complement selection are the phenomena that models generally perform best at.  তবে মডেল বা নির্মাণ, বাইন্ডিং এবং পূর্ণ বিভাগের নির্ভরের সাথে সবচেয়ে বেশী সংগ্রাম করছে। সাধারণত চীনা বেরেটি সাধারণত ১৮. ৮% সঠিকভাবে অর্জন করেছে, যদিও এলস্টিএমএস এবং ৫ গ্রামের অনুষ্ঠান শুধুমাত্র সুযোগের স্তরের উপর', 'bs': 'Lingistički informirane analize jezičkih modela (LMs) doprinose razumijevanju i poboljšanju takvih modela. Ovdje predstavljamo korpus kineskih minimalnih lingvističkih parova (CLiMP) kako bi istražili šta znaju kineske LMs. CLiMP se sastoji od seta 1000 minimalnih pare (MPs) za 16 sintaktičnih kontrasta na kineskom Kineskom, pokrivajući 9 glavnih kineskih jezičkih fenomena. MPs su polu-automatski proizvedeni, a ljudski sporazum sa etiketama u CLiMP je 95,8%. Procjenjujemo 11 različitih LMs na CLiMP, pokrivajući n-grame, LSTMs i kineske BERT. Nalazimo da su klasifikatorski imenski sporazum i izbor dodataka verba fenomeni u kojima se modeli najbolje izvršavaju. Međutim, modeli se najviše bore sa izgradnjom, vezanjem i zavisnošću punjenja praznina. Nakon svega, kineski BERT postiže prosječnu tačnost 81,8%, dok su izvodima LSTMs i 5 grama samo umjereno iznad nivoa šanse.', 'cs': 'Jazykově informované analýzy jazykových modelů (LM) přispívají k pochopení a zlepšení těchto modelů. Zde představujeme korpus čínských lingvistických minimálních párů (CLiMP), abychom zjistili, jaké znalosti čínské LM získávají. CLiMP se skládá ze sad 1000 minimálních párů (MP) pro 16 syntaktické kontrasty v čínštině, které pokrývají devět hlavních čínských jazykových jevů. MPs jsou generovány poloautomaticky a lidská shoda s etiketami v CLiMP je 95,8%. Hodnotíme 11 různých LM na CLiMP, pokrývajících n-gramy, LSTMs a čínské BERT. Zjišťujeme, že shoda klasifikátoru-podstatného jména a výběr doplňku slovesa jsou jevy, ve kterých modely obecně fungují nejlépe. Modely se však nejvíce potýkají se závislostmi na konstrukci, vazbě a výplňové mezery. Celkově čínský BERT dosahuje průměrné 81,8% přesnosti, zatímco výkony LSTMů a 5-gramů jsou pouze středně nad úrovní šance.', 'hy': 'Linguistically informed analyses of language models (LMs) contribute to the understanding and improvement of such models.  Այստեղ մենք ներկայացնում ենք Չինաստանի լեզվաբանական մինիմալ զույգերի կորպուսը, որպեսզի ուսումնասիրենք, թե ինչ գիտելիք են ստանում Չինաստանի լեզվաբանական խումբերը: ԿԼիՄՊ-ը կազմում է 1000 միմինալ զույգ (MPs) շարքեր 16 սինտակտիկ հակադրությունների համար չինարենում, որոնք ներառում են 9 մեծ չինարեն լեզվաբանական երևույթ: MPs-ները կիսաինքնաբերաբար ստեղծվում են, իսկ մարդկային համաձայնությունը կլիմպի մեջ գտնվող պիտակների հետ 95.8 տոկոս է: Մենք գնահատում ենք 11 տարբեր LM-ներ, որոնք նշանակում են n-գրամ, LSMT-ներ և չինական BER-ներ: Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ դասակարգչային անվանումների համաձայնությունը և բայերի ընտրությունը այն երևույթներն են, որոնց մոդելները սովորաբար լավագույն են աշխատում: Այնուամենայնիվ, մոդելները ամենաշատն են պայքարում բա կառուցվածքի, կապի և լրացման տարբեր կախվածությունների հետ: Overall, Chinese BERT achieves an 81.8% average accuracy, while the performances of LSTMs and 5-grams are only moderately above chance level.', 'et': 'Keelemudelite keeleliselt informeeritud analüüsid aitavad kaasa selliste mudelite mõistmisele ja täiustamisele. Siin tutvustame hiina keeleliste minimaalsete paaride korpust (CLiMP), et uurida, millised teadmised hiina keelelised ained omandavad. CLiMP koosneb 1000 minimaalsest paarist (MPs) koosnevatest komplektidest 16 süntaktilise kontrasti jaoks hiina keeles, hõlmates 9 peamist hiina keelelist nähtust. MPd genereeritakse poolautomaatselt ja inimeste nõusolek CLiMP etikettidega on 95,8%. Hindame CLiMP-il 11 erinevat LMi, mis hõlmavad n-gramme, LSTMsid ja hiina BERT-d. Leiame, et klassifitseerija-nimisõna kokkulepe ja verbiliikmete valik on nähtused, milles mudelid üldiselt kõige paremini toimivad. Kuid mudelitel on kõige rohkem probleeme ba konstruktsiooni, sidumise ja täitevahe sõltuvusega. Kokkuvõttes saavutab Hiina BERT keskmise täpsuse 81,8%, samas kui LSTMde ja 5 grammi jõudlused on vaid mõõdukalt kõrgemad juhuslikust tasemest.', 'fi': 'Kielellisesti perustellut analyysit kielimalleista edistävät näiden mallien ymmärtämistä ja parantamista. Tässä esittelemme kiinalaisten kielten minimiparien (CLiMP) korpusen selvittääksemme, mitä tietoa kiinalaiset LM:t hankkivat. CLiMP koostuu 1000 minimiparin (MPs) sarjoista 16 syntaktiselle kontrastille kiinaksi, jotka kattavat 9 suurta kiinan kielellistä ilmiötä. MPs luodaan puoliautomaattisesti, ja ihmisten hyväksyntä CLiMPin etiketeihin on 95,8%. Arvioimme CLiMP:llä 11 erilaista LM:tä, jotka kattavat n-gramman, LSTMin ja kiinalaisen BERT:n. Havaitsemme, että luokittelija-substantiivinen sopivuus ja verbikomplektien valinta ovat ilmiöitä, joissa mallit yleensä suoriutuvat parhaiten. Mallit kamppailevat kuitenkin eniten ba-rakenne-, sidonta- ja täyttöaukkoriippuvuuksien kanssa. Kaiken kaikkiaan kiinalainen BERT saavuttaa 81,8 prosentin keskimääräisen tarkkuuden, kun taas LSTMs ja 5 gramman suorituskyky ovat vain kohtalaisen todennäköisiä.', 'ca': "Les anàlisis lingüísticament informades dels models lingüístics contribueixen a la comprensió i millora d'aquests models. Aquí presentem el cos de parells mínimos lingüístics xinesos (CLiMP) per investigar quin coneixement adquireixen les LMs xineses. CLiMP consisteix en conjunts de 1000 parells mínimos (MPs) per 16 contrasts sinàctics en xinès, que cobreixen 9 fenomens lingüístics xinesos majors. Els MPs són generats semi-automàticament, i l'acord humà amb les etiquetes del CLiMP és del 95,8%. Evaluam 11 LM diferents en CLiMP, que cobreixen n-grams, LSTMs i BERT xinès. We find that classifier-noun agreement and verb complement selection are the phenomena that models generally perform best at.  Tot i així, els models lluiten més amb les dependencies de construcció, vinculació i llençament. Overall, Chinese BERT achieves an 81.8% average accuracy, while the performances of LSTMs and 5-grams are only moderately above chance level.", 'tr': "Dil nusgalarynyň (LMs) düşünüşine we düzeltmesine kömekleýär. Bu ýerde, Hytaý dilleriniň näme bilimi tapdygyny barlamak üçin Hindistanyň küçük çiftlikleri (CLiMP) köpüsini tanyşdyrýarys. CLiMP Çin çe 16 sentaktik faýllary üçin 1000 iň kiçi çift sanlaryndan oluşur. 9 iň köp Çinçe lingwistiki fenomeni öreýär. MPlar yarı otomatik üretildir we insan sözleşmesi CLiMP'de etiketlerle 95.8%-dir. Biz CLiMP'da 11 sany farklı sanat sanyny çykarýarys, n-gramlary, LSTMs we Çinçe BERT'i tapýarys. Biz klassifikat-adly ylalaşyk we verb-ylalaşyk saýlawy nusgalaryň hemişe gowy edip biljek däldir. Emma nusgalar bar, ba gurluşy, baglaýyşy we doldurulýan baglyklar bilen iň köp mücadele edýärler. Ynsakda, Çinçe BERT orta derejesi 81,8%-den tapylýar, LSTM we 5-gramlaryň eserleri diňe orta derejesinde däl.", 'jv': 'structural navigation Punika, awak dhéwé nggunaké karo perusahaan anyar urip lan ijol-ijolan ingkang (CLiMP) nganggep nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang basa sing sumulakno diangkat lunak nggawe jiné. CLiMP nduwe akeh sing sampeyan kanggo 1,000 sing titik (mps) kanggo 16 sing perusahaan seneng Kasambatan, nggawe 9 pangunakno Linguistik sing sik. Ngubah dipunangé karo dipunangé-uwong sing otomatik maneh, lan kabèh barêng-barêng kanggo etiket sing nêmên CLiMP kang 75.8%. Awak dhéwé éntukno 11 ulih luwih-luwih luwih kanggo CLiMP, nggawe n-gram, KST-M, lan BERT Caine. Awak dhéwé éntuk kelas-nambah kuwi kesempatan karo perusahaan langgar-nambah Nanging, model kuwi nggawe paling-paling nggawe barang bagian karo nggawe barang, binding, lan piler-gap Lah berlaké, BERT sing nggawe paling-paling nggambar barang', 'sk': 'Jezikovno informirane analize jezikovnih modelov prispevajo k razumevanju in izboljšanju teh modelov. Tukaj predstavljamo korpus kitajskih jezikovnih minimalnih parov (CLiMP), da bi raziskali, kaj znanje kitajski LM pridobijo. CLiMP je sestavljen iz nizov 1000 minimalnih parov (MPs) za 16 sintaktičnih kontrastov v kitajščini, ki pokrivajo 9 glavnih kitajskih jezikovnih pojavov. MPs so polavtomatsko ustvarjeni, človeško soglasje z oznakami v CLiMP pa je 95,8%. Ocenjujemo 11 različnih LM na CLiMP, ki zajemajo n-grame, LSTMe in kitajske BERT. Ugotavljamo, da sta dogovor med klasifikatorjem in samostalnikom ter izbira glagolskih komplementov pojav, pri katerih modeli običajno najbolje delujejo. Vendar pa se modeli najbolj borijo z odvisnostmi ba konstrukcije, vezave in polnilne vrzeli. Na splošno kitajski BERT doseže povprečno natančnost 81,8%, medtem ko so zmogljivosti LSTMs in 5 gramov le zmerno nad ravnjo naključja.', 'ha': "Anarari da aka sanar da fassarar cikin linguistic da aka ƙara wa misãlai na harshe (LM) na ƙari ga fahimci da gyara wa misãlai masu wannan. Hali, Munã ƙara karatun karatun nau'i na harshen China (CLimp) dõmin mu yi tambaya gani ne ma'anar LM za'a sami. CLipar na ƙunsa da tsarin nau'i 1000 nau'i biyu (par) wa 166 na haɗi cikin Kiniya, na rufe abu 9 mai girma na harshen Kikinai. An samar da parlaman farat-farat ɗaya, kuma wata yarda da mutum da aka samar da alama cikin CLimps na 95.8%. Ina iya ƙaddara da 11 mai dabam-daban LM kan CLimps, suna rufe n-gram, Lstum da kuma China BERT. Tuna gane cewa wata makubalci na fasasar da zaɓen marubuci za'a samu'a samu'in da misãlai ke sami mafi kyau. Amma, misãlai sunã ƙari mafi yawanci da mazan ba, binding, da kuma filin gap-fili. A jumla, shirin BERT na China yana sãmun babban taƙata 81.8%, kuma a lokacin da ake samar LTRM da 5 gram kawai ke da moderate bisa daraja.", 'he': 'ניתוחים מיודעים בשפה של דוגמני שפה (LMs) תורמים להבנה ושיפור של דוגמנים כאלה. כאן, אנחנו מציגים את הקורפוס של זוגות מינימליות שפתיות סיניות (CLiMP) כדי לחקור איזה ידע LMs סיניות להשיג. CLiMP מורכב ממערכות של 1000 זוגות מינימליות (MPs) עבור 16 התנגדות סינטקטיות בסינית, מכסה 9 תופעות שפתיות סיניות גדולות. המפקדים יוצרים חצי אוטומטית, וההסכם האנושי עם התוויות ב CLiMP הוא 95.8%. אנחנו מעריכים 11 LMs שונים על CLiMP, מכילים n-גרם, LSTMs, וברט סיני. אנו מוצאים שההסכם על שמות קלאסיפור והבחירה של מילים הם התופעות שבהן דוגמנים מבצעים בדרך כלל הכי טוב. בכל אופן, דוגמנים נאבקים הכי הרבה עם בניית בא, מחוברים, והתלויות במלאות. באופן כללי, BERT סיני משיג מדויקת ממוצע של 81.8%, בעוד ההופעות של LSTMs ו-5 גרם הם רק במידה מעל רמת סיכוי.', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཡོད་པའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དེ་གིས་ཕལ་ཆེན་ཤུགས་དང་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང འདིར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་སྐད་རིགས་ཆེན་པོ་ཚོའི་མིང་དང་ཅི་ཞེས་འབྱོར་ཡོད་པ་ལས་གསར་གཏོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། CLiMP རྒྱ་ནག་ནང་དུ་དབྱིབས་ཆེན་སྒྲིག་ཆ་གཅིག་ལས་ཆུང་བའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཆ་གཅིག་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བ་ཞིག་ཡིན། MPs are semi-automatically generated, and human agreement with the labels in CLiMP is 95.8%. The MPs are semi-automatically generated, and human agreement with the labels in CLiMP is 95.8%. ང་ཚོས་CLiMP ཐོག་ཏུ་ཡིག་གཟུགས་མེད་པའི་LMs 11་མི་འདྲ་ཞིག་གཟུགས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་དབྱེ་བ་མིན་པའི་ཆོས་ཉིད་དང་བྱ་ཚིག་ཆ་ཤས་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཅིག་ཡོད་པའི་སྣང་ཚུལ་དག་རྣམས་ཀྱིས་མིན་དཔ ཡིན་ནའང་། མིག་དཔེ་གཟུགས་རིས་ba་བཟོ་བརྩོན་དང་། སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་། རྟེན་འབྲེལ་མང་ཤོས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཡོངས་བསྒྲུབ་ཀྱང་། རྒྱ་ནག'}
{'en': 'Progressively Pretrained Dense Corpus Index for Open-Domain Question Answering', 'ar': 'مؤشر المجموعات الكثيفة المُعد مسبقًا للإجابة على أسئلة المجال المفتوح', 'es': 'Índice de corpus denso preentrenado progresivamente para respuestas a preguntas de dominio abierto', 'pt': 'Índice de corpus denso progressivamente pré-treinado para resposta a perguntas de domínio aberto', 'fr': 'Index de corpus dense progressivement préentraîné pour la réponse aux questions de domaine ouvert', 'zh': '以开域问答之渐进式预训练密语料库索引', 'ja': 'オープンドメインの質問への回答のための漸進的な事前訓練された密度コーパス指数', 'hi': 'उत्तरोत्तर Pretrained घने कॉर्पस सूचकांक ओपन डोमेन प्रश्न का उत्तर देने के लिए', 'ru': 'Постепенно предварительно обученный индекс плотного тела для ответов на вопросы открытого домена', 'ga': 'Innéacs Corpais Dlúth Réamhthraenáilte de réir a chéile le haghaidh Freagra ar Cheisteanna Fearainn Oscailte', 'ka': 'პროგრესიგურად გახსნა კოპუს ინდექსი გახსნა დიომინის კითხვის გასაგებისთვის', 'hu': 'Progresszívan előrevetített sűrű corpus index a nyílt domain kérdések megválaszolásához', 'it': 'Indice denso di corpus pretrattato progressivamente per la risposta alle domande a dominio aperto', 'el': 'Προοδευτικά προκαθορισμένος δείκτης πυκνού σώματος για την απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις ανοικτού τομέα', 'kk': 'Ашылған домен сұрақтарының жауап беру үшін бағытталған желілік корпус индексі', 'mk': 'Progressively Pretrained Dense Corpus Index for Open-Domain Question Answering', 'ml': 'തുറന്ന ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം ചോദിക്കുന്നതിനായി പ്രോഗ്രിനീസ് കോര്\u200dപ്സ് സൂക്ഷിപ്പിച്ചു', 'mt': 'Progressively Pretrained Dense Corpus Index for Open-Domain Question Answering', 'mn': 'Нээлтэй холбооны асуулт хариултын хувьд хөгжлийн үхрийн биеийн индекс', 'lt': 'Progresyviai išankstinis tankio kūno indeksas atviro domeno klausimų atsakymui', 'no': 'Prosessivt avtrykk Dens korpusindeks for spørsmål med opna domene', 'pl': 'Progresywnie wstępnie trenowany indeks gęstych korpusów dla odpowiedzi na pytania otwarte domeny', 'ms': 'Indeks Dense Corpus Dilatih secara Progresif untuk Jawapan Pertanyaan Domain Buka', 'sr': 'Прогресивно прекиниран индекс корпуса за открити доменски питање', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරධානයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක කර්පස් සංකේත', 'so': "Jawaabta su'aalaha furan ee gudaha furan", 'ta': 'திறந்த டொமைன் கேள்வி பதில்', 'sv': 'Progressivt Pretrained Dense Corpus Index för svar på öppna domäner', 'ur': 'پرینسٹی دہنس کورپوس سؤال جواب کے لئے پرینسٹی دہنس کورپوس انڈیکس', 'ro': 'Indexul corpus dens pretins progresiv pentru răspunsul la întrebări deschise', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Luôn được xem là chỉ mục cho câu hỏi Open-Domain', 'nl': 'Progressief vooraf getrainde Dense Corpus Index voor het beantwoorden van open-domein vragen', 'bg': 'Прогресивно предтрениран индекс на плътен корпус за отговор на въпроси с отворен домейн', 'da': 'Progressive Pretrained Dense Corpus Index for Open-Domain Spørgsmål Besvarelse', 'ko': '개방 영역 퀴즈의 점차적인 예비 훈련 밀집 어료 라이브러리 인덱스', 'id': 'Progresif Pretrained Dense Corpus Index untuk Jawaban Pertanyaan Domain Buka', 'hr': 'Progresivno pretvaranje indeksa guskog korpusa za odgovor na pitanje otvorenog domena', 'de': 'Progressiv vorgetrainierter Dense Corpus Index für die Beantwortung offener Fragen', 'sw': 'Index ya Makosa ya Dense inayojifunza kwa ajili ya swali huru', 'fa': 'هنرۀ کورپوس تنظیم برای جواب سوال دامنه باز', 'af': 'Progressief Gevorderde Dense Korpus Indeks vir Open- Domein Fraag Antwoord', 'tr': 'Açık alan soru cevaplamak için gelişmiş Dens Kopü Indeksi', 'am': 'የድምፅ ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Indeksi i Dense Corpus i parastërvitur në mënyrë progresive për përgjigjen e pyetjeve të dominit të hapur', 'hy': 'Առաջանաբար նախապատրաստված խիստ կորպոսի ինդեքսը բաց բնագավառի հարցերի պատասխանելու համար', 'az': 'A칞캼q-Domain sual캼n캼n cavab verm톛si 칲칞칲n t톛dbir edil톛n Dens Corpus Indeksu', 'bn': 'খোলা ডোমেইন প্রশ্নের উত্তরের জন্য অগ্রগতিভাবে প্রশিক্ষণিত ডেন্স কোর্পাস সূচী', 'bs': 'Progresivno pretvorio indiks guskog korpusa za odgovor na pitanje otvorenog domena', 'et': 'Progressiivselt eeltreenitud tihe korpuse indeks avatud domeeni küsimustele vastamiseks', 'ca': "L'índex de còrpus de densitat predireix progresivament per respondre a preguntes de domini obert", 'cs': 'Progresivně předtrénovaný index hustého korpusu pro zodpovězení otázek s otevřenou doménou', 'fi': 'Progressiivisesti ennalta koulutettu tiheä corpus-indeksi avoimen verkkotunnuksen kysymysvastaukseen', 'jv': 'Progressiver', 'he': 'אינדקס גוף דנס מתקדם מתקדם לענות על שאלות בתחום פתוח', 'ha': 'Progressively Pretrained Dense Corpus Index for Open-Domain Question Answering', 'bo': 'ཡར་འཕེལ་འགྲོ་བ་དང་སྦྱོར་བའི་Dense Corpus Index ཁ་ཕྱེས་གནས་ཁོངས་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་ལན་གསལ་བ', 'sk': 'Napredno predvadljen indeks gostih korpusov za odgovarjanje na vprašanja z odprto domeno'}
{'en': 'Commonly used information retrieval methods such as TF-IDF in open-domain question answering (QA) systems are insufficient to capture deep semantic matching that goes beyond lexical overlaps. Some recent studies consider the retrieval process as maximum inner product search (MIPS) using dense question and paragraph representations, achieving promising results on several information-seeking QA datasets. However, the pretraining of the dense vector representations is highly resource-demanding, e.g., requires a very large batch size and lots of training steps. In this work, we propose a sample-efficient method to pretrain the paragraph encoder. First, instead of using heuristically created pseudo question-paragraph pairs for pretraining, we use an existing pretrained sequence-to-sequence model to build a strong question generator that creates high-quality pretraining data. Second, we propose a simple progressive pretraining algorithm to ensure the existence of effective negative samples in each batch. Across three open-domain QA datasets, our method consistently outperforms a strong dense retrieval baseline that uses 6 times more computation for training. On two of the datasets, our method achieves more than 4-point absolute improvement in terms of answer exact match.e.g., requires a very large batch size and lots of training steps. In this work, we propose a sample-efficient method to pretrain the paragraph encoder. First, instead of using heuristically created pseudo question-paragraph pairs for pretraining, we use an existing pretrained sequence-to-sequence model to build a strong question generator that creates high-quality pretraining data. Second, we propose a simple progressive pretraining algorithm to ensure the existence of effective negative samples in each batch. Across three open-domain QA datasets, our method consistently outperforms a strong dense retrieval baseline that uses 6 times more computation for training. On two of the datasets, our method achieves more than 4-point absolute improvement in terms of answer exact match.', 'ar': 'طرق استرجاع المعلومات شائعة الاستخدام مثل TF-IDF في أنظمة الإجابة على أسئلة المجال المفتوح (QA) غير كافية لالتقاط المطابقة الدلالية العميقة التي تتجاوز التداخلات المعجمية. تعتبر بعض الدراسات الحديثة أن عملية الاسترجاع هي أقصى بحث داخلي عن المنتج (MIPS) باستخدام تمثيلات فقرة وأسئلة كثيفة ، مما يحقق نتائج واعدة في العديد من مجموعات بيانات ضمان الجودة التي تسعى للحصول على المعلومات. ومع ذلك ، فإن التدريب المسبق لتمثيلات المتجهات الكثيفة يتطلب الكثير من الموارد ، على سبيل المثال ، يتطلب حجم دفعة كبير جدًا والكثير من خطوات التدريب. في هذا العمل ، نقترح طريقة فعالة للعينة لفحص مشفر الفقرة مسبقًا. أولاً ، بدلاً من استخدام أزواج فقرة الأسئلة الزائفة التي تم إنشاؤها بطريقة تجريبية للتدريب المسبق ، نستخدم نموذج تسلسل إلى تسلسل حالي تم اختباره مسبقًا لإنشاء منشئ أسئلة قوي ينشئ بيانات تدريب مسبق عالية الجودة. ثانيًا ، نقترح خوارزمية بسيطة تقدمية للاختبار المسبق لضمان وجود عينات سلبية فعالة في كل دفعة. عبر ثلاث مجموعات بيانات مفتوحة النطاق لضمان الجودة ، تتفوق طريقتنا باستمرار على خط أساس استرجاع كثيف قوي يستخدم 6 مرات حسابًا أكثر للتدريب. في اثنتين من مجموعات البيانات ، تحقق طريقتنا أكثر من 4 نقاط من التحسين المطلق من حيث المطابقة التامة للإجابة.', 'pt': 'Métodos de recuperação de informações comumente usados, como TF-IDF em sistemas de resposta a perguntas (QA) de domínio aberto, são insuficientes para capturar correspondência semântica profunda que vai além das sobreposições lexicais. Alguns estudos recentes consideram o processo de recuperação como a busca máxima do produto interno (MIPS) usando representações densas de perguntas e parágrafos, alcançando resultados promissores em vários conjuntos de dados de QA de busca de informações. No entanto, o pré-treinamento das representações vetoriais densas é altamente exigente em recursos, por exemplo, requer um tamanho de lote muito grande e muitas etapas de treinamento. Neste trabalho, propomos um método amostral eficiente para pré-treinar o codificador de parágrafo. Primeiro, em vez de usar pseudopares de pergunta-parágrafo criados heuristicamente para pré-treinamento, usamos um modelo de sequência a sequência pré-treinado existente para construir um gerador de perguntas forte que cria dados de pré-treinamento de alta qualidade. Em segundo lugar, propomos um algoritmo simples de pré-treinamento progressivo para garantir a existência de amostras negativas efetivas em cada lote. Em três conjuntos de dados de controle de qualidade de domínio aberto, nosso método supera consistentemente uma linha de base de recuperação densa e forte que usa 6 vezes mais computação para treinamento. Em dois dos conjuntos de dados, nosso método alcança uma melhoria absoluta de mais de 4 pontos em termos de correspondência exata de resposta.', 'es': 'Los métodos de recuperación de información de uso común, como TF-IDF en los sistemas de respuesta a preguntas (QA) de dominio abierto, son insuficientes para capturar una correspondencia semántica profunda que va más allá de las superposiciones léxicas. Algunos estudios recientes consideran el proceso de recuperación como una búsqueda interna máxima de productos (MIPS) que utiliza representaciones densas de preguntas y párrafos, logrando resultados prometedores en varios conjuntos de datos de control de calidad que buscan información. Sin embargo, el entrenamiento previo de las representaciones vectoriales densas requiere muchos recursos, por ejemplo, requiere un tamaño de lote muy grande y muchos pasos de entrenamiento. En este trabajo, proponemos un método eficiente en muestras para preentrenar el codificador de párrafos. En primer lugar, en lugar de utilizar pares de pseudopárrafos de preguntas creados heurísticamente para el preentrenamiento, utilizamos un modelo existente de secuencia a secuencia previamente entrenado para crear un potente generador de preguntas que cree datos de preentrenamiento de alta calidad. En segundo lugar, proponemos un algoritmo de preentrenamiento progresivo simple para garantizar la existencia de muestras negativas efectivas en cada lote. En tres conjuntos de datos de control de calidad de dominio abierto, nuestro método supera sistemáticamente una sólida base de recuperación densa que utiliza 6 veces más computación para el entrenamiento. En dos de los conjuntos de datos, nuestro método logra una mejora absoluta de más de 4 puntos en términos de coincidencia exacta de la respuesta.', 'fr': "Les méthodes de récupération d'informations couramment utilisées, telles que TF-IDF dans les systèmes de réponse aux questions (AQ) de domaine ouvert, sont insuffisantes pour capturer une correspondance sémantique profonde qui va au-delà des chevauchements lexicaux. Certaines études récentes considèrent le processus de récupération comme une recherche interne maximale du produit (MIPS) utilisant des représentations denses de questions et de paragraphes, obtenant des résultats prometteurs sur plusieurs ensembles de données d'assurance qualité à la recherche d'informations. Cependant, le pré-apprentissage des représentations vectorielles denses est très gourmand en ressources, par exemple, nécessite une très grande taille de lot et de nombreuses étapes d'apprentissage. Dans ce travail, nous proposons une méthode efficace pour préentraîner l'encodeur de paragraphe. Tout d'abord, au lieu d'utiliser des paires de pseudo-questions et paragraphes créées de manière heuristique pour le pré-entraînement, nous utilisons un modèle séquence-séquence préentraîné existant pour créer un puissant générateur de questions qui crée des données de pré-apprentissage de haute qualité. Ensuite, nous proposons un algorithme de pré-apprentissage progressif simple pour garantir l'existence d'échantillons négatifs efficaces dans chaque lot. Sur trois ensembles de données d'assurance qualité de domaine ouvert, notre méthode surpasse constamment une base de récupération dense qui utilise 6 fois plus de calculs pour la formation. Sur deux des ensembles de données, notre méthode permet d'obtenir une amélioration absolue de plus de 4 points en termes de correspondance exacte des réponses.", 'ja': 'オープンドメイン質問応答（ Ｑ Ａ ）システムにおけるＴＦ － ＩＤＦのような一般的に使用される情報検索方法は、語彙的重複を超えた深い意味マッチングを捉えるのに不十分である。 最近のいくつかの研究では、濃密な質問とパラグラフ表現を使用して、検索プロセスを最大の内部製品検索（ MIPS ）と見なし、いくつかの情報を求めるQAデータセットで有望な結果を達成している。 しかしながら、密集したベクトル表現の事前訓練は、非常にリソース要求性が高く、例えば、非常に大きなバッチサイズ及び多くの訓練ステップを必要とする。 この作業では、段落エンコーダを事前に訓練するためのサンプル効率の高い方法を提案します。 まず、ヒューリスティックに作成された疑似質問パラグラフのペアを事前トレーニングに使用する代わりに、既存の事前トレーニングされたシーケンス間モデルを使用して、高品質の事前トレーニングデータを作成する強力な質問生成器を構築します。 第二に、各バッチに効果的なネガティブサンプルが存在することを保証するための単純なプログレッシブ事前トレーニングアルゴリズムを提案する。 3つのオープンドメインQAデータセットにおいて、当社の方法は、トレーニングに6倍以上の計算を使用する強力な密度の高い検索ベースラインを一貫して上回っています。 2つのデータセットでは、回答の完全一致に関して、当社の方法は4ポイント以上の絶対改善を達成します。', 'hi': 'आमतौर पर उपयोग की जाने वाली जानकारी पुनर्प्राप्ति विधियों जैसे कि ओपन-डोमेन प्रश्न उत्तर (क्यूए) सिस्टम में टीएफ-आईडीएफ गहरे शब्दार्थ मिलान को कैप्चर करने के लिए अपर्याप्त हैं जो लेक्सिकल ओवरलैप से परे है। कुछ हालिया अध्ययनों में पुनर्प्राप्ति प्रक्रिया को अधिकतम आंतरिक उत्पाद खोज (MIPS) के रूप में माना जाता है, जो घने प्रश्न और पैराग्राफ प्रतिनिधित्व का उपयोग करके, कई जानकारी मांगने वाले क्यूए डेटासेट पर आशाजनक परिणाम प्राप्त करता है। हालांकि, घने वेक्टर अभ्यावेदन की पूर्वप्रशिक्षण अत्यधिक संसाधन-मांग है, उदाहरण के लिए, एक बहुत बड़े बैच आकार और बहुत सारे प्रशिक्षण चरणों की आवश्यकता होती है। इस काम में, हम पैराग्राफ एन्कोडर को प्रीट्रेन करने के लिए एक नमूना-कुशल विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। सबसे पहले, प्रीट्रेनिंग के लिए ह्यूरिस्टिक रूप से बनाए गए छद्म प्रश्न-पैराग्राफ जोड़े का उपयोग करने के बजाय, हम एक मजबूत प्रश्न जनरेटर बनाने के लिए एक मौजूदा प्रीट्रेन्ड अनुक्रम-टू-अनुक्रम मॉडल का उपयोग करते हैं जो उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले प्रीट्रेनिंग डेटा बनाता है। दूसरा, हम प्रत्येक बैच में प्रभावी नकारात्मक नमूनों के अस्तित्व को सुनिश्चित करने के लिए एक सरल प्रगतिशील प्रीट्रेनिंग एल्गोरिथ्म का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। तीन ओपन-डोमेन क्यूए डेटासेट में, हमारी विधि लगातार एक मजबूत घने पुनर्प्राप्ति बेसलाइन को मात देती है जो प्रशिक्षण के लिए 6 गुना अधिक गणना का उपयोग करती है। डेटासेट में से दो पर, हमारी विधि उत्तर सटीक मैच के मामले में 4-बिंदु पूर्ण सुधार से अधिक प्राप्त करती है।', 'zh': '开域问答 (QA) 统中常用信息检索法(如 TF-IDF)不足以获越词汇重叠之深语义匹配。 近者研求为用密段落内物为(MIPS),数息QA数集上有期。 然密向量之预训练甚高,如大小步骤。 于是条上样本效率高法以预练段落编码器。 先我非用启发式之伪段落预教之也,用今之预练序于序,以立强大之生成器,以创高质量之预练数也。 其次,条上简渐进式预训练算法,以保批次之阴样本。 三开域 QA 数集,吾法终优用 6 倍以上计练强密检索基线。 其二数集上,其法全配4过分绝改。', 'ga': 'Ní leor modhanna aisghabhála faisnéise a úsáidtear go coitianta amhail TF-IDF i gcórais freagartha ceisteanna fearainn (QA) chun meaitseáil shéimeantach dhomhain a théann níos faide ná forluí foclóireachta a ghabháil. Measann roinnt staidéar a rinneadh le déanaí an próiseas aisghabhála mar uaschuardach táirge inmheánach (MIPS) ag úsáid uiríll dlúth ceisteanna agus ailt, ag baint amach torthaí geallta ar roinnt tacar sonraí QA atá á lorg. Mar sin féin, tá an-éileamh ar acmhainní le haghaidh réamhoiliúint na léiriú dlúth veicteoirí, m.sh., tá baisc-mhéid an-mhór agus go leor céimeanna oiliúna ag teastáil. San obair seo, molaimid modh sampla-éifeachtach chun an t-ionchódóir ailt a réamhthraenáil. Gcéad dul síos, in ionad úsáid a bhaint as péirí ceisteanna pseudo heuristically cruthaithe le haghaidh réamhoiliúint, úsáidimid samhail seicheamh-go-seicheamh atá ann cheana féin pretrained a thógáil gineadóir ceist láidir a chruthaíonn ard-chaighdeán sonraí pretraining. Ar an dara dul síos, molaimid algartam réamhoiliúint forásach simplí chun a chinntiú go bhfuil samplaí diúltacha éifeachtacha ann i ngach baisc. Thar trí thacar sonraí QA d’fhearainn oscailte, sáraíonn ár modh bonnlíne láidir aisghabhála dlúth a úsáideann 6 huaire níos mó ríomh le haghaidh oiliúna. Ar dhá cheann de na tacair sonraí, baineann ár modh feabhas iomlán de níos mó ná 4 phointe amach i dtéarmaí meaitseáil bheacht na bhfreagraí.', 'ru': 'Широко используемые методы поиска информации, такие как TF-IDF в системах ответов на вопросы с открытым доменом (QA), недостаточны для захвата глубокого семантического сопоставления, которое выходит за рамки лексического перекрытия. В некоторых недавних исследованиях процесс извлечения рассматривается как максимальный внутренний поиск продукта (MIPS) с использованием плотных представлений вопросов и абзацев, что позволяет достичь многообещающих результатов в нескольких наборах данных ОК для поиска информации. Однако предварительная подготовка представлений плотного вектора требует больших ресурсов, например, требует очень большого размера партии и большого количества этапов обучения. В этой работе мы предлагаем образцово-эффективный метод предварительной подготовки датчика абзаца. Во-первых, вместо использования эвристически созданных пар псевдопараграфов вопросов для предварительного обучения, мы используем существующую предварительно обученную модель последовательности к последовательности, чтобы построить сильный генератор вопросов, который создает высококачественные данные предварительного обучения. Во-вторых, мы предлагаем простой прогрессивный алгоритм предварительного обучения для обеспечения наличия эффективных отрицательных образцов в каждой партии. В трех открытых наборах данных QA наш метод последовательно превосходит сильную плотную базовую линию поиска, которая использует в 6 раз больше вычислений для обучения. На двух массивах данных наш метод достигает более чем 4-балльного абсолютного улучшения с точки зрения точного совпадения ответов.', 'ka': 'საერთოდ გამოიყენებული ინფორმაციის მიღება მეტი, როგორც TF-IDF კითხვა კითხვა (QA) სისტემებში არ უფრო მსგავსი, რომ ელექსიკალური გადარჩენების ძალიან სიმენტიკური გადარჩენა. ზოგიერთი ახალი სწავლებები აღმოჩენის პროცესის მაქსიმალური ინტერფექტური პროდისტის ძება (MIPS) გამოიყენება ძალიან კითხვა და პრაგრაფიკური გამოსახულებების გამოყენება, რომლები მაგრამ, ძალიან ძალიან დიდი ზომა და ძალიან მსგავსი განსწავლების გამოსახულებების გამოსახულება არის ძალიან რესურსების შესაძლებლობა. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ წარმოდგინეთ მონაცემების ეფექტიური მეტი, რომელიც პრაგრაფიკოდერის კოდერების წინასწორება. პირველად, ჰეურისტიკურად შექმნა პესეუდის კითხვა-პრაგრაფიკური ზოგის გამოყენებაზე, ჩვენ გამოყენებთ მსგავსი წინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწ მეორე, ჩვენ გვეძლევა ერთადერთი პროგრესიგური ალგორიტიმ, რომელიც უნდა დავუწეროთ ეფექტიური ნექტიგური წიგნის არსებობას ყოველ წიგნიში. სამი გახსნა დიომინის QA მონაცემების საზოგადომის გარეშე, ჩვენი მეთოდი შემდეგ უფრო ძალიან ძალიან გარეშე ფესტური ხაზი, რომელიც 6-ჯერ უფრო მეტი კომპ ორი მონაცემების შესახებ, ჩვენი მეთოდი 4 წერტილის აბსოლუტური უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო მეტი', 'hu': 'Az olyan gyakran haszn찼lt inform찼ci처visszakeres챕si m처dszerek, mint a TF-IDF ny챠lt domain k챕rd챕sv찼laszol처 rendszerekben, nem elegend흷ek a lexikai 찼tfed챕seken t첬lmutat처 m챕ly szemantikai egyez챕sek r철gz챠t챕s챕hez. N챕h찼ny k철zelm첬ltbeli tanulm찼ny a lekeres챕si folyamatot maxim찼lis bels흷 term챕kkeres챕snek (MIPS) tekinti, s킥r킥 k챕rd챕s- 챕s bekezd챕sreform찼ci처k seg챠ts챕g챕vel, 챠g챕retes eredm챕nyeket 챕rve el sz찼mos inform찼ci처keres흷 min흷s챕gi adatk챕szleten. A s킥r킥 vektorreprezent찼ci처k el흷k챕sz챠t챕se azonban nagyon er흷forr찼sokat ig챕nyel, pl. nagyon nagy t챕telm챕retet 챕s sok k챕pz챕si l챕p챕st ig챕nyel. Ebben a munk찼ban egy mintahat챕kony m처dszert javasolunk a bekezd챕sk처dol처 el흷k챕sz챠t챕s챕re. El흷sz철r is, ahelyett, hogy heurisztikusan l챕trehozott pszeudo k챕rd챕s-bekezd챕s p찼rokat haszn찼ln찼nk az el흷k챕sz챠t챕shez, egy megl챕v흷 el흷k챕sz챠tett szekvencia-szekvencia modellt haszn찼lunk egy er흷s k챕rd챕sgener찼tor l챕trehoz찼s찼ra, amely kiv찼l처 min흷s챕g킥 el흷k챕sz챠t챕si adatokat hoz l챕tre. M찼sodszor egy egyszer킥 progressz챠v el흷k챕sz챠t챕si algoritmust javasolunk, amely biztos챠tja a hat챕kony negat챠v mint찼k l챕tez챕s챕t minden egyes t챕telben. H찼rom ny챠lt tartom찼ny첬 min흷s챕gbiztos챠t찼si adatk챕szleten kereszt체l m처dszer체nk k철vetkezetesen fel체lm첬lja az er흷s s킥r킥 visszakeres챕si alapot, amely 6-szor t철bb sz찼m챠t찼st haszn찼l az edz챕shez. M처dszer체nk k챕t adatk챕szleten t철bb mint 4 pontos abszol첬t javul찼st 챕r el a v찼lasz pontos egyez챕s tekintet챕ben.', 'el': 'Οι κοινώς χρησιμοποιούμενες μέθοδοι ανάκτησης πληροφοριών, όπως η TF-IDF σε συστήματα απαντήσεων σε ερωτήσεις ανοικτού τομέα (QA) δεν επαρκούν για την καταγραφή βαθιάς σημασιολογικής αντιστοίχισης που υπερβαίνει τις λεξικές επικαλύψεις. Ορισμένες πρόσφατες μελέτες θεωρούν τη διαδικασία ανάκτησης ως μέγιστη εσωτερική αναζήτηση προϊόντων (χρησιμοποιώντας πυκνές αναπαραστάσεις ερωτήσεων και παραγράφων, επιτυγχάνοντας ελπιδοφόρα αποτελέσματα σε διάφορα σύνολα δεδομένων QA που αναζητούν πληροφορίες. Ωστόσο, η προεπεξεργασία των πυκνών διανυσματικών αναπαραστάσεων είναι ιδιαίτερα απαιτητική σε πόρους, π.χ., απαιτεί ένα πολύ μεγάλο μέγεθος παρτίδας και πολλά βήματα εκπαίδευσης. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο αποτελεσματικής δειγματοληψίας για την προεπιλογή του κωδικοποιητή παραγράφων. Πρώτον, αντί να χρησιμοποιούμε heuristisch δημιουργημένα ψευδο-ζεύγη ερωτήσεων-παραγράφων για προεπεξεργασία, χρησιμοποιούμε ένα υπάρχον προεπεξεργασμένο μοντέλο ακολουθίας-ακολουθίας για να χτίσουμε μια ισχυρή γεννήτρια ερωτήσεων που δημιουργεί δεδομένα προεπεξεργασίας υψηλής ποιότητας. Δεύτερον, προτείνουμε έναν απλό προοδευτικό αλγόριθμο προετοιμασίας για να διασφαλίσουμε την ύπαρξη αποτελεσματικών αρνητικών δειγμάτων σε κάθε παρτίδα. Σε τρία σύνολα δεδομένων QA ανοικτού τομέα, η μέθοδος μας ξεπερνά σταθερά μια ισχυρή πυκνή γραμμή ανάκτησης που χρησιμοποιεί 6-φορές περισσότερους υπολογισμούς για την εκπαίδευση. Σε δύο από τα σύνολα δεδομένων, η μέθοδος μας επιτυγχάνει πάνω από τέσσερα σημεία απόλυτη βελτίωση όσον αφορά την ακριβή αντιστοιχία απάντησης.', 'it': "I metodi di recupero delle informazioni comunemente usati come TF-IDF nei sistemi di risposta alle domande a dominio aperto (QA) non sono sufficienti per catturare una corrispondenza semantica profonda che va oltre le sovrapposizioni lessicali. Alcuni studi recenti considerano il processo di recupero come la massima ricerca interna di prodotto (MIPS) utilizzando rappresentazioni dense di domande e paragrafi, ottenendo risultati promettenti su diversi set di dati QA alla ricerca di informazioni. Tuttavia, il pretraining delle rappresentazioni vettoriali dense richiede molto risorse, ad esempio richiede un lotto molto grande e molti passaggi di formazione. In questo lavoro, proponiamo un metodo di campionamento efficiente per la pre-formazione dell'encoder di paragrafo. In primo luogo, invece di utilizzare coppie pseudo-domande create euristicamente per il pretraining, usiamo un modello sequenza-sequenza pre-addestrato esistente per costruire un generatore di domande forte che crei dati di pretraining di alta qualità. In secondo luogo, proponiamo un semplice algoritmo di pretraining progressivo per garantire l'esistenza di campioni negativi efficaci in ogni lotto. Attraverso tre set di dati QA a dominio aperto, il nostro metodo supera costantemente una base di recupero densa forte che utilizza 6 volte più calcoli per l'allenamento. Su due dei set di dati, il nostro metodo raggiunge più di 4 punti di miglioramento assoluto in termini di corrispondenza esatta della risposta.", 'kk': 'ТF-IDF секілді ашық доменге сұрақ (QA) жүйелерінде көпшілікті мәліметті алу әдістері (ашық доменге) жауап беру (QA) жүйелерінде терең семантикалық сәйкестіктерді алу үшін жетк Кейбір жуырдағы зерттеулердің алу процесін QA деректер қорларының бірнеше мәліметті іздеу үшін тұрақтық сұрақтар мен абзекті түсініктемелерді қолданатын максималдық ішкі продукттарды іздеу ( Бірақ тұрақтық вектордың кеңейтуі - ресурстар көп талап ететін, мысалы, өте үлкен бөлшектер мен оқыту қадамдарын талап етеді. Бұл жұмыс ішінде бұл параграф кодтамасын алдын- ала қарау үшін үлгі эффективті әдісін таңдаймыз. Біріншіден, геуристикалық псевдо сұрақ параграфиясын қолдану үшін қолданып, біз қолданып тұрған реттеу- реттеу үлгісін қолданып, күшті сұрақ генераторын құру үшін күшті сапатты өзгерту деректерін құру үшін. Екіншіден, біз әрбір бөлшекте ең жақсы негативті үлгілер бар екенін қарапайым прогрессивнің алгоритмін ұсынамыз. QA деректер қорларында үш ашылған доменге тұрады, біздің әдіміз оқыту үшін 6 рет есептеу үшін күшті жетілдіру негізгі сызығын таңдайды. Екінші деректер қорларында, біздің әдіміміз 4 нүкте абсолютті жақсы жауап сәйкестігімен көп жақсарту үшін жеткізеді.', 'lt': 'Dažnai naudojami informacijos gavimo metodai, pavyzdžiui, TF-IDF atviro domeno atsakymo į klausimus (QA) sistemose, yra nepakankami giliam semantiniam derinimui, kuris viršija leksinius sutapimus. Kai kuriuose neseniai atliktuose tyrimuose atkūrimo procesas laikomas didžiausiu vidiniu produkto paieška (MIPS), naudojant tankius klausimus ir punktus, ir gaunami žadantys rezultatai keliuose informacijos paieškos QA duomenų rinkiniuose. Vis dėlto tankių užkrato pernešėjų atspaudų išankstinis mokymas yra labai reikalingas ištekliams, pvz., reikalingas labai didelis partijos dydis ir daug mokymo etapų. Šiame darbe siūlome imtinai efektyvų metodą, skirtą išankstiniam parašymo kodatoriaus nustatymui. Pirma, užuot naudoję heuristiškai sukurtas pseudo klausimų pastraipų poras išankstiniam mokymui, mes naudojame esamą iš anksto parengtą sekos į seką model į, kad sukurtume stiprų klausimų generatorių, kuris sukuria aukštos kokybės išankstinio mokymo duomenis. Antra, siūlome paprastą laipsnišką išankstinio mokymo algoritmą, kad kiekvienoje partijoje būtų užtikrintas veiksmingų neigiamų mėginių buvimas. Per tris atviros srities QA duomenų rinkinius mūsų metodas nuosekliai viršija stiprų tankių atkūrimo pradinį tašką, kuriame mokymui naudojamas 6 kartus didesnis skaičiavimas. Dviejuose duomenų rinkiniuose mūsų metodas siekia daugiau kaip 4 punktų absoliutaus pagerėjimo atsakymo tikslumo požiūriu.', 'mk': 'Обично употребени методи за преземање на информации како TF-IDF во системите за одговори на прашања на отворен домен (QA) не се доволни за да се фати длабоко семантично совпаѓање кое поминува надвор од лексичките прекривања. Некои неодамнешни студии го сметаат процесот на преземање за максимално внатрешно пребарување на производи (MIPS) користејќи густи прашања и претставувања на параграфи, постигнувајќи ветувачки резултати на неколку набори податоци за QA кои бараат However, the pretraining of the dense vector representations is highly resource-demanding, e.g., requires a very large batch size and lots of training steps.  In this work, we propose a sample-efficient method to pretrain the paragraph encoder.  Прво, наместо да користиме хеористички создадени псевдо прашање-параграф парови за претренирање, користиме постоечки претрениран модел од секвенца до секвенца за да изградиме силен генератор на прашања кој создава висококвалитетни податоци за претренирање. Второ, предложуваме едноставен прогресивен алгоритм за претренирање за да се осигури постоењето на ефикасни негативни примероци во секоја партија. Across three open-domain QA datasets, our method consistently outperforms a strong dense retrieval baseline that uses 6 times more computation for training.  На двата од податоците, нашиот метод постигнува повеќе од 4 точки апсолутно подобрување во поглед на точниот одговор.', 'ml': 'സാധാരണ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ചെടുക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d, തുറന്ന ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ ഉത്തരം (QA) സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക് ക്യൂഎ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റെറ്റുകള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിക്കുന്ന ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഏറ്റവും ഉള്ളിലുള്ള ഉ എന്നാലും കൂടുതല്\u200d വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ പ്രദര്\u200dശനത്തിന്റെ മഴ വളരെ വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ ആവശ്യമാണ്, ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി വളരെ വലിയ ബാച്ച് വലിപ്പം ആ ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ടാമ്പിള്\u200d സാക്ഷാലോഭമുള്ള രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രാപ്റ്റഫ് കോഡെര്\u200d പ്രചരിപ്പിക്കാന ആദ്യം, ഹെയൂരിസ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന് പകരം പെയുഡോ ചോദ്യം- പാര്\u200dപ്പപ്പഫ് ജോട്ടുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടി നിലവിലുള്ള മഴ രണ്ടാമതായി, ഓരോ ബാച്ചിലും പ്രവർത്തികമായ നെഗേറ്റീവ് ടാമ്പുകളുണ്ടെന്ന് ഉറപ്പ് വരുത്താന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു സാധാരണ പ്രോഗ്രേവ മൂന്നു തുറന്ന ഡോമെയിന്\u200d ക്യൂഎ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ രീതി ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d രണ്ടില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നാല് പോയിന്റിലേക്കാള്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് ഉത്തരം ശരിയാ', 'mn': 'ТF-IDF шиг нээлттэй холбоотой асуулт (QA) системд ашиглаж байгаа мэдээлэл авах аргыг ихэвчлэн ашигладаг. Лексийн давхарлаас гадна гүнзгий семантик тоглоом барьж чадахгүй. Зарим саяхан судалгаанууд хадгалах үйл явцыг QA өгөгдлийн сангийн олон мэдээлэл хайж буй олон мэдээлэл дээр мөрөөдөлтэй үр дүнг ашиглан хадгалах боломжтой доторх бүтээгдэхүүний хайх (MIPS) гэж үздэг. Гэхдээ жингийн векторын төлөөлөлт нь маш их баялаг шаардлагатай, жишээлбэл маш том хэмжээний, маш олон сургалтын алхам шаардлагатай. Энэ ажлын тулд бид параграфын кодлогчийг урьдчилан ашиглах жишээ бүтээмжтэй аргыг санал болгож байна. Эхлээд, хюристик хэлбэрээр суралцах хэлбэрээр суралцах pseudo-paragraph хоёрыг ашиглахын оронд бид суралцах хэлбэрээр давтагдсан дарааллын загварыг ашиглаж, өндөр чанартай давтагдсан мэдээллийг бүтээх хүчтэй асуулт гаргагч Хоёр дахь, бид нэг бүрт үр дүнтэй сөрөг өргөвөлжийг байлгахын тулд энгийн хөгжлийн алгоритмыг санал болгож байна. Гурван нээлттэй холбоотой QA өгөгдлийн сан дээр бидний арга нь сургалтын тулд 6 дахин их тооцоололтыг ашигладаг хүчтэй байнга авах суурь шугам юм. Хоёр дахь өгөгдлийн сангийн хувьд бидний арга нь 4 цэгээс илүү тохиромжтой хариултын тохиромжтой тохиромжтой хувьд гарч ирнэ.', 'no': 'Vanleg brukte informasjonshenting-metodar som TF-IDF i open-domain-spørsmålsystemet (QA) er ikkje nok for å henta dyp semantisk treff som går over leksiske overlapp. Somme nyleg studiar ser ut at prosessen for henting er maksimum interne produktsøk (MIPS) ved hjelp av tett spørsmål og avsnittreprezentasjonar, og når det gjer promiserende resultat på fleire QA- datasett som søker etter informasjon. Det er imidlertid å gjere vektorrepresentasjonane for tette vektorar for stor ressurskrev, f.eks. krev ein veldig stor partistørrelse og mange trekk. I denne arbeida foreslår vi ein prøveeffektiv metode for å gjera avsnittkoderen. Først, i staden for å bruka pseudoavsnittparagrafen som er generert i heuristisk, bruker vi ein eksisterande sekvens- til- sekvens- modell for å bygge ein sterk spørsmål- generator som lagar høg kvalitetslingsdata. Andre, vi foreslår ein enkel progressiv forskyvingsalgoritme for å sikre at det finst effektiv negative prøver i kvar partis. På tre opna domeneQA-datasett utfører metoden vårt konsistentvis eit sterk tett retrieveringsbaseline som brukar 6 ganger meir rekningar for opplæring. På to av dataseta oppnår metoden vårt meir enn 4 punkt absolutt forbedring med nøyaktig svar.', 'pl': 'Powszechnie stosowane metody pozyskiwania informacji, takie jak TF-IDF w systemach odpowiedzi na pytania otwarte domeny (QA) są niewystarczające do przechwytywania głębokiego dopasowania semantycznego, wykraczającego poza nakładanie się leksykaliczne. Niektóre ostatnie badania uważają proces odzyskiwania jako maksymalne wewnętrzne wyszukiwanie produktów (MIPS) z wykorzystaniem gęstych reprezentacji pytań i akapitów, osiągając obiecujące wyniki na kilku zbiorach danych dotyczących jakości poszukujących informacji. Jednak wstępne szkolenie gęstych reprezentacji wektorowych jest bardzo wymagające zasobów, np. wymaga bardzo dużego rozmiaru partii i wielu kroków szkoleniowych. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy próbkowo efektywną metodę wstępnego przygotowania kodera akapitowego. Po pierwsze, zamiast używać heurystycznie utworzonych pseudo par pytań-akapitów do treningu wstępnego, używamy istniejącego wstępnie treningowego modelu sekwencji do sekwencji, aby zbudować silny generator pytań, który tworzy wysokiej jakości dane wstępnego treningu. Po drugie, proponujemy prosty algorytm progresywnego wstępnego treningu, aby zapewnić istnienie skutecznych próbek ujemnych w każdej partii. W przypadku trzech zbiorów danych QA w otwartej domenie nasza metoda konsekwentnie przewyższa silną gęstą bazę podstawową pobierania, która wykorzystuje 6-krotnie więcej obliczeń do treningów. W przypadku dwóch zbiorów danych nasza metoda osiąga ponad 4-punktową absolutną poprawę pod względem dokładnego dopasowania odpowiedzi.', 'sr': 'Često su koristili metode prikupljanja informacija poput TF-IDF u sistemima otvorenog domena odgovora na pitanje (QA) nisu dovoljne da uhvate duboko semantičko odgovaranje koje se više od leksičkih preklapanja. Neke nedavne studije smatraju procesom prikupljanja maksimalnim unutrašnjim pretraživanjem proizvoda (MIPS) koristeći gusto pitanje i predstavljanje paragrafa, ostvarivši obećavajuće rezultate na nekoliko podataka za potragu za informacijama QA. Međutim, pretvaranje gustih predstavljanja vektora je veoma zahteva resurse, na primjer, zahteva veoma veliku veličinu serije i puno koraka obuke. U ovom poslu predlažemo efikasnu metodu uzorka da pretvorimo koder paragrafa. Prvo, umjesto da koristimo heuristički stvorene pseudoparagraf pitanja za pretkivanje, koristimo postojeći model pretkišenog sekvence do sekvence kako bi izgradili jaki generator pitanja koji stvara podatke o visokom kvalitetu pretkišenja. Drugo, predlažemo jednostavan progresivni algoritam pretkivanja kako bi osigurali postojanje efikasnih negativnih uzorka u svakoj seriji. Kroz tri otvorena domena QA podataka, naša metoda stalno iznosi jaku gustu osnovnu liniju koja koristi 6 puta više raèunanja za obuku. Na dva podataka, naša metoda postiže više od 4 bodova apsolutno poboljšanje u smislu odgovora taènog odgovora.', 'ro': 'Metodele obișnuite de recuperare a informațiilor, cum ar fi TF-IDF în sistemele de răspuns la întrebări cu domeniu deschis (QA) sunt insuficiente pentru a capta potrivirea semantică profundă care depășește suprapunerile lexicale. Unele studii recente consideră procesul de recuperare ca fiind căutarea internă maximă a produsului (MIPS), folosind reprezentări dense de întrebări și paragrafe, obținând rezultate promițătoare pe mai multe seturi de date QA care caută informații. Cu toate acestea, pregătirea reprezentărilor vectoriale dense este foarte solicitantă de resurse, de exemplu, necesită o dimensiune foarte mare a lotului și o mulțime de pași de formare. În această lucrare, propunem o metodă eficientă de eșantionare pentru a pregăti codorul de paragraf. În primul rând, în loc să folosim perechi de pseudo-întrebări create euristic pentru pregătire, folosim un model secvență-la-secvență existent pentru a construi un generator de întrebări puternic care creează date de pregătire de înaltă calitate. În al doilea rând, propunem un algoritm simplu de pregătire progresivă pentru a asigura existența unor probe negative eficiente în fiecare lot. Pe parcursul a trei seturi de date QA cu domeniu deschis, metoda noastră depășește în mod constant o bază de referință puternică de recuperare densă, care utilizează de 6 ori mai multe calcule pentru formare. Pe două dintre seturile de date, metoda noastră realizează o îmbunătățire absolută de peste 4 puncte în ceea ce privește potrivirea exactă a răspunsului.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජන ප්\u200dරශ්න (QA) පද්ධතියේ TF-IDF වගේ තොරතුරු ගන්න විදිහාවක් භාවිත කරලා තියෙන්නේ නැහැ ලෙක්සිකාල් වර් අලුත් අධ්\u200dයානය සමහර අධ්\u200dයානය සමහර විශ්වාස කරනවා ලැබෙන්න ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාව විශ්වාස කරන්න අඩුම් අඩුම් ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ පැරතිපත්ත නමුත්, වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයේ ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය ගොඩක් අවශ්\u200dයයි, උදාහරණයෙන්, ගොඩක් ලොකු බැට්ස් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සහ ගොඩ මේ වැඩේදී, අපි පැරතිච්චි කෝඩාර් එක ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරගන්න සැමැල් ප්\u200dරකාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා. මුලින්, හෙයුරිස්ටිකියෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්න-ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරයෝ දෙවනිය, අපි සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරධානයක් අල්ගෝරිත්මයක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරනවා හැම බැට්ටම් වලට ප්\u200dරතිකාරිය අනු QA දත්ත සෙට් තුනක් අරින්න, අපේ විධානය සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හරියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා බලාපොරොත්තු ප්\u200d දත්ත සැට් දෙකකින්, අපේ විධානය හතරක් වඩා ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන්.', 'so': "Isticmaalka helitaanka macluumaadka ee caadiga ah sida TF-IDF oo ku jawaabaya su'aalaha furan ee domain (QA) uma filan in la qabsado habab dheer oo la mid ah oo ka baxsan qoraalka lexicada. Some recent studies consider the retrieval process as maximum inner product search (MIPS) using dense question and paragraph representations, achieving promising results on several information-seeking QA datasets.  Si kastaba ha ahaatee dib u soo saaridda wadanka cidhiidhiga ah waa mid aad u baahan tahay nolol badan, tusaale ahaan waxay u baahan tahay qiyaas aad u weyn iyo tallaabooyin waxbarasho badan. Markaas waxan, waxaynu horumarinaynaa qaab sameyn oo faa’iido ah si aan u hor dhigno kooxda qoraalka. Marka ugu horeysa, ayadoo a an ku isticmaali karno noocyo-su'aal-paragraf, waxaynu isticmaalnaa tusaale hore oo hore u soo daatay, si aan u dhisno dhaqaalaha su'aalo xoog badan oo sameynaya macluumaad aad u badan oo soo daabacda. Second, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa horumarinta oo fudud, si aan u xaqiijinno in ay ku jirto samooyin faa’iido leh oo caqli ah oo dhan. Saddexda xafiiska QA ee furan, qaabkanagu wuxuu si joogto ah u sameeyaa shabakad aad u adag oo u isticmaalaya 6 jeer oo ka badan waxbarashada. Labada kooban ee macluumaadka, qaabkanagu wuxuu gaadhaa wax ka badan 4 barxad oo kali ah oo la hagaajiyo si saxda ah jawaabta.", 'sv': 'Vanligt anv채nda informationsh채mtningsmetoder som TF-IDF i open-domain fr책gesvarssystem 채r otillr채ckliga f철r att f책nga djup semantisk matchning som g책r ut철ver lexikala 철verlappningar. Vissa nyligen genomf철rda studier betraktar h채mtningsprocessen som maximal inre produkts철kning (MIPS) med hj채lp av t채ta fr책ge- och paragrafrepresentationer, vilket ger lovande resultat p책 flera informationss철kande QA-dataupps채ttningar. Men f철rberedelsen av de t채ta vektorrepresentationerna 채r mycket resurskr채vande, t.ex. kr채ver en mycket stor satsstorlek och massor av tr채ningssteg. I detta arbete f철resl책r vi en proveffektiv metod f철r att f철rbereda styckekodaren. F철r det f철rsta, i st채llet f철r att anv채nda heuristiskt skapade pseudo fr책geparagrafpar f철r f철rbehandling, anv채nder vi en befintlig f철rbelagd sekvens-till-sekvensmodell f철r att bygga en stark fr책gegenerator som skapar h철gkvalitativa f철rbehandlingsdata. F철r det andra f철resl책r vi en enkel progressiv f철rberedelsealgoritm f철r att s채kerst채lla f철rekomsten av effektiva negativa prover i varje sats. Genom tre 철ppna dom채ner QA-dataupps채ttningar 철vertr채ffar v책r metod konsekvent en stark t채t h채mtningsgr채ns som anv채nder sex g책nger mer ber채kningar f철r tr채ning. P책 tv책 av dataupps채ttningarna uppn책r v책r metod mer 채n 4-punkts absolut f철rb채ttring n채r det g채ller svarets exakta matchning.', 'ta': 'பொதுவாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட தகவல் மீட்டெடுப்பு முறைமைகள் TF- IDF திறந்த- domain கேள்வி பதில் (QA) அமைப்புகள் லெக்சிக்ஸிக்கு மேற்கு செல்லும் ஆழமா சமீபத்தில் சில படிப்புகள் மீட்டெடுக்கும் செயல்பாடு அதிகபட்ச உள்ளுள்ள பொருள் தேடு (MIPS) தேடுதல் மற்றும் பத்தியின் குறிப்புகளை பயன்படுத However, the pretraining of the dense vector representations is highly resource-demanding, e.g., requires a very large batch size and lots of training steps.  இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு மாதிரி குறியீட்டை முறைமையை முன்னோடுகிறோம். முதலில், உயர்ந்த கேள்வி கேள்வி அளபுருக்களை பயன்படுத்துவதற்கு பதிலாக நாம் முன்னேற்றுவதற்கு பயன்படுத்தி இருக்கும் ஒரு தற்போதைய வெளியீட்டு வரிசையில்  இரண்டாவது, மூன்று திறந்த களம் கியூஏ தரவுத்தளங்களுக்கு மேலும், எங்கள் முறைமையில் முறையாக ஒரு வலிமையான கனத்தை மீட்டெடுக்கும் அடிப்பட இரண்டு தரவு அமைப்புகளில், எங்கள் முறைமையில் 4 புள்ளியில் முழுமையான முழுமையான முன்னேற்றம் பெறுகிறது, பதில் சர', 'ms': 'Kaedah pemulihan maklumat yang biasa digunakan seperti TF-IDF dalam sistem jawapan soalan domain terbuka (QA) tidak mencukupi untuk menangkap persamaan semantik dalam yang melebihi persamaan leksikal. Beberapa kajian baru-baru ini menganggap proses pemulihan sebagai pencarian maksimum produk dalaman (MIPS) menggunakan pertanyaan tebal dan perwakilan paragraf, mencapai keputusan yang berjanji pada beberapa set data QA yang mencari maklumat. Bagaimanapun, perkembangan vektor tebal diperlukan banyak sumber, contohnya, memerlukan saiz seri yang sangat besar dan banyak langkah latihan. In this work, we propose a sample-efficient method to pretrain the paragraph encoder.  First, instead of using heuristically created pseudo question-paragraph pairs for pretraining, we use an existing pretrained sequence-to-sequence model to build a strong question generator that creates high-quality pretraining data.  Kedua, kita cadangkan algoritma pembelajaran progresif mudah untuk memastikan wujud sampel negatif yang berkesan dalam setiap batch. Melalui tiga set data QA domain terbuka, kaedah kami secara konsisten melampaui dasar pemulihan padat yang kuat yang menggunakan 6 kali lebih komputasi untuk latihan. On two of the datasets, our method achieves more than 4-point absolute improvement in terms of answer exact match.', 'ur': 'عمومی طور پر استعمال کیا گیا معلومات پھیرنے کی طریقے جیسے TF-IDF پرسش سوال (QA) سیستموں میں جواب دینے کے لئے کافی نہیں ہے کہ عمیق سیمانٹیکی مطالعہ پکڑے جو لکسیکل اورلپ سے زیادہ جاتی ہے۔ بعض اگلے مطالعہ کے مطالعہ کے مطالعہ کے مطالعہ سے پھیرنے کی پروسس کو مہربانی داخلی محصول تلاش (MIPS) کے طور پر مہربانی سؤال اور پاراگراف نمایش کے مطالعہ سے سمجھتے ہیں، اور بہت سی معلومات کے مطا However, the pretraining of the dense vector representations is highly resource-demanding, e.g., requires a very large batch size and a lot of training steps. اس کام میں ہم ایک نمونہ-اثرات طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ پاراگراف کوڈر کو پیش کریں۔ پہلے، ہم نے ایک مضبوط سوال جنرائیٹر بنانے کے لئے ایک مضبوط سؤال-پاراگراگراگراگراگراگراگراگراگراگراگراگراگراگراٹ کی استعمال کی جگہ سے ایک موجود مختلف سفارش کے ساتھ استعمال کیا ہے کہ ایک مضبوط سوال جنرائیٹر بنائے جو بہت سی دوسرا، ہم ایک ساده پیشرفت آلگوریٹم کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ ہر گروہ میں اثر منفی نمونے کی موجودگی ثابت قدم رکھے۔ تین اوپن ڈومین QA ڈاٹ سٹ کے درمیان، ہمارا طریقہ ہمیشہ ایک مضبوط گہرے پھیرنے کی بنسٹ لین کو اضافہ کرتا ہے جو 6 بار زیادہ کمپیوٹر کے لئے استعمال کرتا ہے. دو ڈاٹ سٹ پر ہماری طریقہ 4 پوینٹ سے زیادہ مطلوب سوداگری حاصل کرتی ہے', 'mt': 'Commonly used information retrieval methods such as TF-IDF in open-domain question answering (QA) systems are insufficient to capture deep semantic matching that goes beyond lexical overlaps.  Xi studji reċenti jikkunsidraw il-proċess ta’ rkupru bħala t-tiftix massimu intern tal-prodott (MIPS) bl-użu ta’ rappreżentazzjonijiet densi ta’ mistoqsijiet u paragrafi, li jiksbu riżultati promettenti fuq diversi settijiet ta’ dejta QA li jfittxu informazzjoni. Madankollu, it-taħriġ minn qabel tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet densi tal-vetturi jeħtieġ ħafna riżorsi, pereżempju, jeħtieġ daqs kbir ħafna tal-lott u ħafna passi ta’ taħriġ. F’din il-ħidma, qed nipproponu metodu effiċjenti fil-kampjun biex il-kodifikatur tal-paragrafu jitfassal minn qabel. L-ewwel nett, minflok l-użu ta’ par ta’ mistoqsijiet psewdo-paragrafi maħluqa ġeuristikament għat-taħriġ minn qabel, a ħna nużaw mudell eżistenti ta’ sekwenza għal sekwenza mħarreġ minn qabel biex nibnu ġeneratur qawwi ta’ mistoqsijiet li joħloq dejta ta’ taħriġ minn qabel ta’ kwalità għolja. It-tieni nett, nipproponu algoritmu sempliċi progressiv ta’ qabel it-taħriġ biex tiġi żgurata l-eżistenza ta’ kampjuni negattivi effettivi f’kull lott. Across three open-domain QA datasets, our method consistently outperforms a strong dense retrieval baseline that uses 6 times more computation for training.  On two of the datasets, our method achieves more than 4-point absolute improvement in terms of answer exact match.', 'uz': "@ info Keyingi qanchalik taʼminlovchilar QA maʼlumotni qidirish uchun juda katta narsa qidirish (MIPS) sifatida qidiriladi. Lekin, qiyin vektorning tashkilotlarini tasavvur qilish juda juda murfi talab qilishi kerak, masalan, juda katta kichkina oʻlchami va ko'p taʼminlovchi qadamlar kerak. Bu ishda, biz paragraph kodvalini o'rganish uchun misol effektiv usulni tahrirlash. Birinchi so'zni heuristik soʻrov- paragraf qoʻllarini ishlatishdan o'rniga o'rganish uchun, biz juda ko'proq taʼminlovchi soʻrov modelini ishlatamiz. Ikkinchi so'zda, biz o'zgarishni o'rganish algoritni ishlatish uchun oddiy darajada davom etamiz. Uchta ochiq domen QA maʼlumotlar tarkibida, bizning usuli davom etish uchun 6 marta ko'proq kompyuterni ishlatish mumkin. Ikki maʼlumotlar tarkibida, bizning usuli javob toʻgʻri qiymatiga ko'proq 4 nuqtdan ortiq yaxshi bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Thông thường sử dụng phương pháp thu thập thông tin như TF-IDF trong các hệ thống trả lời câu hỏi tự động (QA) không đủ để bắt giữ độ ngữ pháp sâu rộng vượt ra ngoài dạng từ. Một vài nghiên cứu gần đây xem tiến trình tìm kiếm là tiến trình tìm kiếm tối đa sản phẩm nội tâm (MIPS) sử dụng các mô tả dày và dày đặc, đạt được kết quả hứa hẹn về nhiều bộ dữ liệu Tìm kiếm thông tin QA. Tuy nhiên, tình hình trước các biểu đồ vector đậm chất chứa các nguồn tài nguyên cao, ví dụ, yêu cầu kích cỡ mẻ rất lớn và rất nhiều bước huấn luyện. Chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp hiệu quả mẫu để giải mã đoạn. Đầu tiên, thay vì dùng các cặp cầu câu hỏi thần kinh chế để làm việc trước, chúng ta sử dụng một mô hình dãy-tới-trình tự tồn tại để tạo ra một máy tạo câu hỏi mạnh tạo ra các dữ liệu sản lượng trước chất lượng cao. Thứ hai, chúng tôi đề nghị một thuật to án nâng cấp đơn giản để đảm bảo tồn tại các mẫu âm tính hiệu quả trong mỗi mẻ. Trong ba tập tin cá nhân rộng, phương pháp của chúng ta hoàn toàn vượt qua một cơ sở dữ liệu chứa dày đặc, sử dụng gấp sáu lần tính toán để tập luyện. Trên hai bộ dữ liệu, phương pháp của chúng ta đạt được nhiều hơn bốn điểm tuyệt đối tiến bộ về tỷ lệ trả lời chính xác.', 'nl': 'Veelgebruikte methoden voor informatieterugwinning zoals TF-IDF in open-domein vragenantwoordsystemen (QA) zijn onvoldoende om diepe semantische matching vast te leggen die verder gaat dan lexicale overlappingen. Sommige recente studies beschouwen het terugwinningsproces als maximale interne productzoekfunctie (MIPS) met behulp van dichte vraag- en alinea-representaties, waardoor veelbelovende resultaten worden bereikt op verschillende informatie-zoekende QA-datasets. Het pretrainen van de dichte vectorrepresentaties is echter zeer veeleisend aan resources, bijvoorbeeld vereist een zeer grote batchgrootte en veel trainingsstappen. In dit werk stellen we een sample-efficiënte methode voor om de alinea encoder vooraf te trainen. Ten eerste, in plaats van heuristisch gecreëerde pseudo vraag-alinea paren voor pretraining te gebruiken, gebruiken we een bestaand vooraf getraind sequence-to-sequence model om een sterke vragengenerator te bouwen die hoogwaardige pretraining data creëert. Ten tweede stellen we een eenvoudig progressief pretraining algoritme voor om het bestaan van effectieve negatieve monsters in elke partij te verzekeren. In drie open-domein QA-datasets presteert onze methode consistent beter dan een sterke dichte terugwinningsbaseline die 6-maal meer berekeningen gebruikt voor training. Op twee van de datasets bereikt onze methode meer dan 4-punts absolute verbetering in termen van antwoord exact match.', 'bg': 'Често използваните методи за извличане на информация, като например в системи за отговор на въпроси с отворен домейн, са недостатъчни за улавяне на дълбоко семантично съвпадение, което надхвърля лексикалните припокривания. Някои скорошни проучвания разглеждат процеса на извличане като максимално вътрешно търсене на продукти (МИПС), използвайки плътно представяне на въпроси и абзаци, постигайки обещаващи резултати върху няколко набора данни за оценка на качеството, търсещи информация. Въпреки това, предтренирането на плътните векторни изображения изисква много ресурси, напр. изисква много голям размер на партидата и много стъпки за обучение. В тази работа предлагаме ефективен метод за предварително трениране на абзационния кодер. Първо, вместо да използваме евристично създадени псевдо двойки въпроси-абзаци за предтрениране, ние използваме съществуващ предварително трениран модел последователност към последователност, за да изградим силен генератор на въпроси, който създава висококачествени данни за предтрениране. Второ, предлагаме прост прогресивен алгоритъм за предварително обучение, за да се гарантира наличието на ефективни отрицателни проби във всяка партида. В рамките на три съвкупности от данни с отворен домейн, методът ни постоянно надминава силна плътна база за извличане, която използва 6 пъти повече изчисления за обучение. При два от наборите от данни методът ни постига повече от 4 точки абсолютно подобрение по отношение на точното съвпадение на отговора.', 'da': 'Almindeligt anvendte informationssøgningsmetoder såsom TF-IDF i open-domain spørgsmålsbesvarelsessystemer (QA) er utilstrækkelige til at fange dyb semantisk matchning, der går ud over leksikalske overlapninger. Nogle nyere undersøgelser betragter hentningsprocessen som maksimal indre produktsøgning (MIPS) ved hjælp af tætte spørgsmål- og afsnitsrepræsentationer, hvilket opnår lovende resultater på flere informationssøgende QA-datasæt. Men forudtræningen af de tætte vektorrepræsentationer er meget ressourcekrævende, f.eks. kræver en meget stor batchstørrelse og masser af træningstrin. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en prøveeffektiv metode til at forudregne afsnitskoderen. For det første, i stedet for at bruge heuristisk oprettede pseudo spørgsmål-afsnit par til forudtræning, bruger vi en eksisterende forudtrænet sekvens-til-sekvens model til at bygge en stærk spørgsmål generator, der skaber forudtræningsdata af høj kvalitet. For det andet foreslår vi en simpel progressiv forudtræningsalgoritme for at sikre eksistensen af effektive negative prøver i hver batch. På tværs af tre open-domæne QA datasæt overgår vores metode konsekvent en stærk tæt hentningslinje, der bruger 6 gange mere beregning til træning. På to af datasættene opnår vores metode mere end 4-punkts absolut forbedring i forhold til svarets nøjagtige match.', 'hr': 'Često se koriste metode prikupljanja informacija poput TF-IDF u sustavima odgovora na pitanje otvorenog domena (QA) nisu dovoljne za uhvatiti duboko semantičko odgovaranje koje se više od leksičkih preklapanja. Neki nedavni ispitivanja smatraju proces prikupljanja maksimalnim unutrašnjim pretraživanjima proizvoda (MIPS) koristeći gusto pitanje i predstavljanje odstavka, ostvarivši obećavajuće rezultate na nekoliko podataka QA-a koji traže informacije. Međutim, pretvaranje gustih predstavljanja vektora zahtijeva jako resurse, na primjer, zahtijeva veoma veliku veličinu serije i puno koraka obuke. U ovom poslu predlažemo učinkovitu metodu uzoraka kako bi pretvorili koder paragrafa. Prvo, umjesto da koristimo heuristički stvorene pseudo-paragraf pitanja za pretkivanje, koristimo postojeći model pretkišene sekvence do sekvence kako bi izgradili jaki generator pitanja koji stvara podatke o visokoj kvaliteti pretkišenja. Drugo, predlažemo jednostavan progresivni algoritam pretvaranja kako bi osigurali postojanje učinkovitih negativnih uzorka u svakoj seriji. Kroz tri otvorena domena QA podataka, naša metoda konsekventno iznosi jaku gustu osnovnu liniju koja koristi 6 puta više računala za obuku. Na dva podataka, naša metoda postiže više od 4 bodova apsolutno poboljšanje u smislu odgovora točno odgovara.', 'de': 'Häufig verwendete Methoden zur Informationsgewinnung wie TF-IDF in Open-Domain Question Responsing (QA)-Systemen reichen nicht aus, um tiefes semantisches Matching zu erfassen, das über lexikalische Überlappungen hinausgeht. Einige neuere Studien betrachten den Retrieval-Prozess als maximale innere Produktsuche (MIPS) unter Verwendung von dichten Fragen- und Absatzrepräsentationen und erzielen vielversprechende Ergebnisse auf mehreren informationssuchenden QA-Datensätzen. Das Vortraining der dichten Vektordarstellungen ist jedoch sehr ressourcenintensiv, z.B. erfordert eine sehr große Batchgröße und viele Trainingsschritte. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir eine sample-effiziente Methode vor, um den Absatzkoder vorzutrainieren. Anstatt heuristisch erstellte Pseudo-Frage-Absatz-Paare für das Vortraining zu verwenden, verwenden wir ein vorhandenes vortrainiertes Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Modell, um einen starken Fragegenerator zu erstellen, der hochwertige Vortrainingsdaten erstellt. Zweitens schlagen wir einen einfachen progressiven Vortrainingsalgorithmus vor, um die Existenz effektiver negativer Proben in jeder Charge zu gewährleisten. Bei drei offenen QA-Datensätzen übertrifft unsere Methode konsequent eine starke, dichte Retrieval-Baseline, die 6-mal mehr Berechnungen für das Training verwendet. Auf zwei der Datensätze erreicht unsere Methode mehr als 4-Punkt absolute Verbesserung hinsichtlich der Antwort exakt übereinstimmen.', 'ko': '개방 분야 퀴즈 시스템에서 TF-IDF 등 자주 사용하는 정보 검색 방법은 어휘가 중첩된 심층적 의미를 초월한 일치를 포획하기에 부족하다.최근 일부 연구에서는 검색 과정을 밀집된 문제와 단락 표시를 사용하는 최대 내적 검색(MIPS)으로 보고 여러 정보를 찾는 QA 데이터 집합에서 희망적인 결과를 얻었다.그러나 밀집 벡터가 나타내는 예비 훈련은 자원에 대한 요구가 매우 높다. 예를 들어 매우 많은 대량과 대량의 훈련 절차가 필요하다.이 작업에서, 우리는 단락 인코더를 미리 훈련시키는 간단하고 효과적인 방법을 제시했다.우선, 우리는 계발식으로 만들어진 위조 문제 단락을 사용하여 예비 훈련을 하지 않고, 기존의 예비 훈련 서열을 서열 모델로 사용하여 강력한 문제 생성기를 구축하여 고품질의 예비 훈련 데이터를 만든다.그 다음에 우리는 간단한 점진적 예훈련 알고리즘을 제시하여 모든 횟수에 효과적인 음성 샘플이 존재하도록 확보했다.세 개의 개방역 QA 데이터 집중에서 우리의 방법은 6배의 계산량을 사용하여 훈련하는 강력한 밀집 검색 기선보다 우수하다.그 중 두 데이터 집합에서 우리의 방법은 답안이 정확하게 일치하는 데 있어서 4점을 넘는 절대적인 개선을 실현했다.', 'sw': 'Mifumo ya upatikanaji wa taarifa kwa kawaida kama vile TF-IDF katika majibu ya wazi ya ndani (QA) hazina kutosha kukamata ushirikiano mkubwa wa kimapenzi unaokwenda zaidi ya upepo wa lexico. Baadhi ya tafiti za hivi karibuni zinachukua mchakato wa kurudisha upya kama utafutaji wa bidhaa za ndani (MIPS) kwa kutumia swali kubwa na uwakilizaji wa paragraph, na kutafuta matokeo yanayoahidi kuhusiana na seti kadhaa za taarifa zinazotafuta QA. Hata hivyo, matumizi ya uwakilishi wa vector nzito ni mahitaji makubwa ya rasilimali, kwa mfano, inahitaji ukubwa mkubwa na hatua nyingi za mafunzo. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza njia yenye ufanisi wa sampuli ya kutengeneza utaratibu wa paragraph. Kwanza, badala ya kutumia ujumla kulitengeneza viwili vya swali-paragraph ya pseudo kwa ajili ya kutengeneza mvua, tunatumia modeli iliyoendelea kwa mfululizo wa mfululizo ili kutengeneza muuzaji mkali wa swali ambalo linatengeneza taarifa za matumizi ya juu. Pili, tunapendekeza utambulisho rahisi unaoendelea kutengeneza algorithi ili kuhakikisha uwepo wa sampuli hasi katika kila ngazi. Katika seti za takwimu tatu za wazi za QA, mbinu yetu kwa kawaida inafanya msingi wa kurejea kwa kiasi kikubwa unaotumia hisabati zaidi 6 kwa ajili ya mafunzo. Katika seti mbili za taarifa, mbinu yetu inafanikiwa kuboresha zaidi ya pointi 4 kwa namna ya kupambana na jibu sahihi.', 'id': 'Commonly used information retrieval methods such as TF-IDF in open-domain question answering (QA) systems are insufficient to capture deep semantic matching that goes beyond lexical overlaps.  Beberapa studi baru-baru ini mempertimbangkan proses penemuan sebagai pencarian produk dalam maksimum (MIPS) menggunakan pertanyaan padat dan representation paragraf, mencapai hasil yang berjanji pada beberapa set data QA yang mencari informasi. Namun, perkelahian dari representation vektor tebal sangat membutuhkan sumber daya, misalnya, membutuhkan ukuran batch yang sangat besar dan banyak langkah latihan. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan metode efisien sampel untuk mempelajari pengkode paragraf. Pertama, selain menggunakan pasangan pertanyaan-paragraf pseudo yang dibuat heuristikal untuk latihan, kita menggunakan model rangkaian-ke-rangkaian yang ada sebelum latihan untuk membangun generator pertanyaan yang kuat yang menciptakan data rangkaian tinggi. Kedua, kami mengusulkan algoritma progresif untuk memastikan ada sampel negatif efektif di setiap batch. Melalui tiga set data QA domain terbuka, metode kita secara konsisten melampaui batas dasar penemuan yang kuat yang menggunakan 6 kali lebih banyak komputasi untuk latihan. Pada dua set data, metode kita mencapai lebih dari 4 titik peningkatan mutlak dalam terma jawaban persis cocok.', 'fa': 'به طور معمولی از روش\u200cهای گیری اطلاعات مثل TF-IDF در سیستم\u200cهای پاسخ سوال\u200cهای دامنی باز (QA) برای گرفتن هماهنگ\u200cهای سیمانی عمیق که بیشتر از اورلپ\u200cهای زبانی می\u200cرود، کافی نیستند. بعضی مطالعات اخیر این فرایند را به عنوان بزرگترین جستجوی محصولات داخلی (MIPS) با استفاده از سؤال داخلی و نمایش\u200cهای پاراگراف به نظر می\u200cگیرند که نتایج\u200cهای قول\u200cدهنده در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای QA برای جستجوی با این حال، پیش\u200cگیری نمایش\u200cهای ویکتور\u200cهای dense هستند که از منابع بسیار نیاز دارند، مثلاً اندازه\u200cهای بسیار بزرگ و قدم\u200cهای آموزش نیاز دارند. در این کار، ما یک روش عملکرد نمونه را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا قانون رمز پاراگراف را پیشنهاد کنیم. اول، به جای استفاده از جفت سؤال و پاراگراف با حوریستیک برای تغییر کردن، ما از یک مدل پیش ریخته شده برای ساختن یک ژنراتور سوال قوی که داده های تغییر کیفیت بالا را ایجاد می\u200cکند استفاده می\u200cکنیم. دوم، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک الگوریتم پیشرفت پیشرفت ساده برای اطمینان وجود نمونه\u200cهای منفی در هر گروه. در طول سه مجموعه داده\u200cهای QA باز دامنی، روش ما همیشه از یک خط پایین\u200cشناسی بسیار قوی استفاده می\u200cکند که از ۶ برابر محاسبات بیشتری برای آموزش استفاده می\u200cکند. در دوتا از مجموعه داده ها، روش ما بیشتر از چهار نقطه به بهترین کامل در مورد مسابقه دقیق جواب رسیده است.', 'tr': 'Aç-domain soragy jogap (QA) sistemlerinde TF-IDF ýaly köplenç maglumat alma yöntemleri (golaý semantik öňünden geçen) çykarmak üçin ýeterlik däldir. Käbir ýakyn öňki araştyrmalar gaýd etmek prosesiniň ýokary daşary produkt araştyrmasynyň (MIPS) müňin soragy we paragraf üýtgetmeklerini ullanýar, bir näçe maglumat alan QA veri setirlerine üçin söz bermek netijesini ýetip ýetýärler. Bu şekilde yoğun vektör temsillerinin önlenmesi yüksek kaynaklı, meselâ, çok büyük toprak ölçüsi ve birçok e ğitim adımlarına ihtiyacı var. Bu işde paragraf kodlayıcını önlemek için örnek etkinlik yöntemi teklif ediyoruz. Öncelikle, suçsuz soragy-paragraf çiftlerini önlenmek üçin heuristik şeklinde üretilen pseudo soragy-paragraf çiftlerini kullanmak yerine, biz mevcut bir önlenmiş sıralama-sıralama modelini güçlü bir sorag jeneratörü oluşturmak üçin yüksek kaliteli önlenmek üçin kullanırız İkinci olarak, her toplumda etkileşimli negatif örneklerin varlığını sağlamak için basit bir ilerleme algoritmi teklif ediyoruz. Üç a çik domeny QA veri setleri arasynda, bizim yöntemimiz eğitim üçin 6 çarpı artyk hesaplamak üçin güçlü bir yoğun geri alma baselini üstüne getirir. Iki sany veri setirinde, biziň metodamyz 4 noktalardan has dogry eşleşme şeklinde ulaşar.', 'af': "Gewoonlik gebruik inligting ontvang metodes soos TF-IDF in open-domein vraag antwoord (QA) stelsels is onvoldoende om diep semantiese ooreenstemming te vang wat buite leksiese ooreenstemmings gaan. Sommige onlangse studie beskou die ontvang proses as maksimum binneste produktsoek (MIPS) deur te gebruik dens vraag en paragraaf voorstellings, tot beloftende resultate op verskeie inligting- soek QA datastelle. Maar die voorstelling van die dense vektor-voorstellings is baie hulpbron-nodig, bv. â\x80\x99n baie groot grootte en baie onderwellingsstappe nodig. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n voorbeeld-effektief metode om die paragraaf-enkoder te trek. Eerste, in plaas van gebruik van heuristies geskep pseudo vraag-paragraaf paar vir pretraining, gebruik ons 'n bestaande pretrained volgorde-na-volgorde model om 'n sterk vraag genereerder te bou wat skep hoë-kwaliteit pretraining data. Tweede, ons voorstel 'n eenvoudige progresiewe pretreën algoritme om die bestaande van effektiewe negatiewe voorbeelde in elke groep te verseker. Deur drie oop- domein QA datastelle, ons metode het konsistentlik 'n sterk dens herhaal basislien wat 6 maal meer rekenaar gebruik vir onderwerp. Op twee van die datastel, ons metode bereik meer as 4 punt absoluut verbetering ingevolge antwoord presies ooreenstem.", 'sq': 'Metodat e përdorura të zakonshme të marrjes së informacionit të tilla si TF-IDF në sistemet e përgjigjeve të pyetjeve në domeni të hapur (QA) nuk janë të mjaftueshme për të kapur përputhje semantike të thella që shkon përtej mbishtypjeve lexike. Some recent studies consider the retrieval process as maximum inner product search (MIPS) using dense question and paragraph representations, achieving promising results on several information-seeking QA datasets.  Megjithatë, parastërvitja e përfaqësimeve të dendura të vektorëve është shumë e nevojshme për burime, për shembull, kërkon një madhësi shumë të madhe partie dhe shumë hapa stërvitjeje. Në këtë punë, ne propozojmë një metodë të efektshme për të përgatitur koduesin e paragrameve. Së pari, në vend që të përdorim çifte pseudo-pyetjeje-paragrafe të krijuara heuristikisht për parastërvitje, përdorim një model ekzistues të parastërvitur sekuencë-në-sekuencë për të ndërtuar një gjenerator të fortë pyetjeje që krijon të dhëna parastërvitjeje të cilësisë së lartë. Së dyti, ne propozojmë një algoritëm të thjeshtë përpara stërvitjeje për të siguruar ekzistencën e mostrave negative efektive në çdo seri. Nëpërmjet tre grupeve të dhënash QA në domeni të hapur, metoda jonë vazhdimisht mbizotëron një bazë të fortë të rregjistrimit të dendur që përdor 6 herë më shumë llogaritje për trajnimin. Në dy nga të dhënat, metoda jonë arrin më tepër se 4 pikë përmirësim absolut në lidhje me përgjigjen e saktë.', 'am': 'በተለመደው የተጠቃሚ የመረጃ ማድረግ ዘዴዎች እንደ TF-IDF በክፍት ዶሜን ጥያቄ (QA) ስርዓቶች ከሌክሲካዊ overlapዎች በላይ የሚሄደውን ጥልቅ ስምዓት ለመያዝ አይበቃቸውም። በአሁኑ የጥያቄ ጥያቄ እና የጽሑፍ መልዕክቶች በተጠቃሚ የጥያቄ ጥያቄ እና የጽሑፍ መልዕክቶች የተጠቃሚ ፍጥረቶችን ለማግኘት የቁጥጥር መረጃዎችን ለማግኘት የሚችል ፍሬዎችን አግኝቷል፡፡ ነገር ግን የዋላው የሜክሮር መልዕክቶች መፍጠር እጅግ የከበረ resource ጥያቄ ነው፤ ምሳሌ እጅግ ታላቅ የቡክ ክፍል እና ብዙ ተማሪ ደረጃዎች ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የጽሑፉን የፊደል ጽሑፍ ለመፍጠር የምንችል ምሳሌ እናስባለን፡፡ በመጀመሪያ፣ በሀርዮስቲካ ጥያቄ-paragraph ሁለት ዓይነቶችን በመፍጠር ፋንታ፣ አሁን ያሉትን አካባቢ የክፍለ ግንኙነት-ወደ ስክታዊ ሞዴል እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ ሁለተኛ፣ በሁሉም ባርክ ውስጥ የጥያቄ የnegative ምሳሌዎች መሆኑን ለማረጋገጥ ቀላል አካባቢ መፍጠርን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በሦስት ክፍት የክፈት የQA ዳታተሮች ላይ ሥርዓታችን ለትምህርት 6 እጥፍ ይጨምር ዘንድ የሚጠቅመውን ብርቱ ድምፅ የመድረጊያውን መሳሳይ ያሳርፋል፡፡ ከሁለቱ ዳታዎች ውስጥ የሥርዓታችን ሥርዓት በ4 ነጥብ ክፍተት ትክክለኛ ማድረግ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Հաճախ օգտագործված ինֆորմացիայի վերադարձման մեթոդները, ինչպիսիք են ԹՖ-IDF-ը բաց տիեզերքի հարցերի պատասխանատվության (QA) համակարգերում, բավարար չեն խորը սեմանտիկ համեմատությունների վերցնելու համար, որոնք գնում են լեքսիկական հակապա Որոշ վերջին ուսումնասիրություններ կարծում են, որ վերադարձման գործընթացը մեծագույն ներքին արտադրանքի որոնումը (MISP) է, օգտագործելով խիստ հարց և պարագյուտ ներկայացումներ, ստանալով խոստացող արդյունքներ մի քանի տեղեկություն փնտրող Այնուամենայնիվ, խտուն վեկտորների ներկայացումների նախապատրաստումը շատ հարկավոր է ռեսուրսների, օրինակ, պահանջում է շատ մեծ շարք չափեր և շատ ուսուցման քայլեր: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք նմուշ-արդյունավետ մեթոդ պարագայում կոդավորիչը նախապատրաստելու համար: Առաջինը, համեմատաբար ստեղծված կեղծ հարցերի-պարագայում զույգերի օգտագործելու փոխարեն, մենք օգտագործում ենք գոյություն ունեցող նախադասավորված հաջորդականության-հաջորդականության մոդել, որպեսզի կառուցենք ուժեղ հարցերի գեներատոր, որը ստեղծում է բարձր Երկրորդ, մենք առաջարկում ենք պարզ առաջընթացիկ նախադասության ալգորիթմ, որպեսզի ապահովենք, որ յուրաքանչյուր բաժանման մեջ արդյունավետ բացասական նմուշներ կան: Երեք բաց տիեզերքի QA տվյալների համակարգերի միջոցով մեր մեթոդը մշտապես գերազանցում է ուժեղ խտուն վերադարձման հիմքը, որը օգտագործում է 6 անգամ ավելի շատ հաշվարկներ ուսուցման համար: On two of the datasets, our method achieves more than 4-point absolute improvement in terms of answer exact match.', 'az': 'TF-IDF kimi açıq domena sual cevapları (QA) sistemlərində çox alınan məlumat alma metodları (QA) ilə təkrar edilmək üçün çətin semantik istifadə etməyə kifayət deyildir. QA verilən qurğuları ilə vəd verilən növbətlərin müəyyən etdiyi məsələlər istifadə edərək yeni təhsil sürətini maksimum iç ürək araması (MIPS) kimi hesab edirlər. Ancaq yox vektör g östərilmələrinin önlənməsi çox qüvvət tələb edəndir, məsələn, çox böyük qüvvət böyüklüyü və çox təhsil adımları lazımdır. Bu işdə, paragraflı kodlayıcını önləşdirmək üçün nümunə-effektiv yolu təklif edirik. İlk dəfə, heuristik olaraq yaratdığı pseudo sual-paragraflı çift kullanmaq yerinə, yüksək kaliteli pretraining məlumatlarını yaradan çox qüvvətli sual generatörünü yaratmaq üçün mevcut bir sıralama-sıralama modeli istifadə edirik. İkincisi, hər dəstədə effektiv negatif nümunələrin varlığını təsdiqləmək üçün basit progresiv tədbir algoritmi təklif edirik. Üç a çıq domena QA veri qurğuları arasında, bizim metodumuz təhsil üçün 6 kat daha çox hesablama istifadə edir. İki verilən qurduğumuz yolumuz 4 nöqtədən daha çox yaxşılıq edir.', 'bn': 'সাধারণত ব্যবহার করা তথ্য পুনরুদ্ধার পদ্ধতি যেমন টিএফ-আইডিএফ খোলা ডোমেইন প্রশ্নের উত্তর (কিউ এ) সিস্টেমের প্রশ্নের উত্তর (কিউএ) প্রশ্নের মধ্যে প্ সাম্প্রতিক কিছু গবেষণা বিবেচনা করে যে পুনরুদ্ধার প্রক্রিয়া সর্বোচ্চ ভিতরের পণ্য অনুসন্ধান হিসেবে সর্বোচ্চ প্রশ্ন এবং প্যারাফ প্রতিনিধি কিন্তু গভীর ভেক্টরের প্রতিনিধিত্বের বৃষ্টি অত্যন্ত সম্পদের দাবি রয়েছে, যেমন অনেক বড় ব্যাচের আকার এবং অনেক প্রশিক্ষণের পদক্ষেপ প প্রয় এই কাজে আমরা একটি নমুনা কার্যকর পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি প্যারাফ এনকোডারের প্রাপ্ত করার জন্য। প্রথমত, প্রশ্ন-প্যারাফ প্রশ্নের জোড়া ব্যবহার করার পরিবর্তে আমরা বৃষ্টি করার জন্য একটি বিদ্যমান প্রশ্নের প্রাকৃতি ব্যবহার করি, যা উচ্চমাত্রার বৃষ্টির তথ্য দ্বিতীয়, আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি প্রত্যেক ব্যাচে কার্যকর নেতিবাচক নমুনা নিশ্চিত করার জন্য একটি সাধারণ অগ্রগতির প্রস্তাব বৃষ্ তিনটি খোলা ডোমেইন কিউএ ডাটাসেটের পাশে, আমাদের পদ্ধতি সাধারণত একটি শক্তিশালী গভীর গভীর পুনরুদ্ধার বেসালাইনের ব্যবহার করে যা প্রশ ডাটাসেটের দুইজনে আমাদের পদ্ধতি সঠিকভাবে উত্তরের মিলে ৪ বিন্দুর বেশী উন্নতি পায়।', 'cs': 'Běžně používané metody vyhledávání informací, jako je TF-IDF v otevřených doménových systémech odpovědí na otázky (QA), nejsou dostatečné k zachycení hlubokého sémantického porovnání, které přesahuje lexikální překrývání. Některé nedávné studie považují proces vyhledávání za maximální vnitřní vyhledávání produktů (MIPS) s využitím hustých reprezentací otázek a odstavců, které dosahují slibných výsledků na několika databázích QA hledajících informace. Předtrénování hustých vektorových reprezentací je však vysoce náročné na zdroje, např. vyžaduje velmi velkou šarži a mnoho tréninkových kroků. V této práci navrhujeme vzorkově efektivní metodu pro předškolení odstavcového kodéru. Za prvé, namísto heuristicky vytvořených pseudo párů otázek a odstavců pro předtrénování používáme existující model sekvence-sekvence k vytvoření silného generátoru otázek, který vytváří vysoce kvalitní data předtrénování. Za druhé navrhujeme jednoduchý progresivní algoritmus předtréninku, který zajistí existenci efektivních negativních vzorků v každé šarži. Napříč třemi datovými sadami QA s otevřenou doménou naše metoda konzistentně překonává silný hustý základní princip vyhledávání, který využívá šestinásobně více výpočtů pro trénink. Na dvou datových sadách dosahuje naše metoda více než čtyřbodového absolutního zlepšení, pokud jde o přesnou shodu odpovědí.', 'bs': 'Često se koriste metode prikupljanja informacija poput TF-IDF u sustavima odgovora na pitanje otvorenog domena (QA) nisu dovoljne da uhvati duboko semantičko odgovaranje koje prelazi preko leksičkih preklapanja. Neki nedavni ispitivanja smatraju procesom prikupljanja maksimalnim unutrašnjim pretraživanjem proizvoda (MIPS) koristeći gusto pitanje i predstavljanje paragrafa, ostvarivši obećavajuće rezultate na nekoliko podataka QA-a koji traže informacije. Međutim, pretvaranje gustih predstavljanja vektora je veoma zahtijevanje resursa, na primjer, zahtijeva veoma veliku veličinu serije i puno koraka obuke. U ovom poslu predlažemo efikasnu metodu uzorka da pretvorimo koder paragrafa. Prvo, umjesto da koristimo pseudo-paragraf pitanja za pretkivanje, koristimo postojeći model pretkišenog sekvence do sekvence kako bi izgradili jaki generator pitanja koji stvara podatke o visokoj kvaliteti pretkišenja. Drugo, predlažemo jednostavan progresivni algoritam pretvaranja kako bi osigurali postojanje efikasnih negativnih uzorka u svakoj seriji. Kroz tri otvorena domena QA podataka, naša metoda stalno iznosi jaku gustu osnovnu liniju koja koristi 6 puta više računala za obuku. Na dva podataka, naša metoda postiže više od 4 bodova apsolutno poboljšanje u smislu odgovora tačno odgovarajućeg odgovora.', 'et': 'Tavaliselt kasutatavad teabehankimise meetodid, nagu TF-IDF avatud domeeni küsimustele vastamise süsteemides, ei ole piisavad sügava semantilise sobitamise tuvastamiseks, mis ulatub leksikaalsest kattumisest kaugemale. Mõned hiljutised uuringud peavad otsimisprotsessi maksimaalseks sisemiseks tooteotsinguks (MIPS), kasutades tihedaid küsimus- ja lõikeesitusi, saavutades paljutõotavaid tulemusi mitmete teavet otsivate kvaliteedi tagamise andmekogumite puhul. Tihedate vektorikujutiste eeltreenimine on aga väga ressursinõudlik, näiteks nõuab väga suurt partii suurust ja palju treeninguid. Käesolevas töös pakume välja näidisefektiivse meetodi lõigukodeerija eeltreenimiseks. Esiteks, selle asemel, et kasutada heuristiliselt loodud pseudoküsimus-lõigu paare eeltreeninguks, kasutame olemasolevat eeltreenitud jada-jada mudelit, et ehitada tugev küsimusgeneraator, mis loob kvaliteetseid eeltreeningu andmeid. Teiseks pakume välja lihtsa progressiivse eeltreeningu algoritmi, et tagada efektiivsete negatiivsete proovide olemasolu igas partiis. Kolme avatud domeeni kvaliteedi tagamise andmekogumi puhul ületab meie meetod pidevalt tugevat tihedat tagasivõtmise algväärtust, mis kasutab koolituseks 6 korda rohkem arvutusi. Kahe andmekogumi puhul saavutab meie meetod enam kui 4 punkti absoluutse paranemise vastuse täpse vaste osas.', 'ca': "Métodes de recuperació d'informació comunament utilitzats com TF-IDF en sistemes de resposta a preguntes de domini obert (QA) no són suficients per capturar una combinació semàntica profunda que va més enllà de les sovrapposicions lècsiques. Alguns estudis recents consideren el procés de recuperació com una cerca máxima interna de productes (MIPS) fent servir representacions denses de preguntes i paràgrafs, obtenint resultats prometedors en diversos conjunts de dades QA que busquen informació. No obstant això, la pré-capacitació de les denses representacions de vectors és molt exigent de recursos, per exemple, requereix una gran mida de lots i moltes etapes d'entrenament. In this work, we propose a sample-efficient method to pretrain the paragraph encoder.  En primer lloc d'utilitzar parells pseudo-paràgrafs de preguntes creats heurísticament per a pré-treinar, utilitzem un model de seqüència a seqüència pré-treinar existent per construir un fort generador de preguntes que crea dades de pré-treinar d'alta qualitat. En segon lloc, proposem un algoritme progressiv de pré-entrenament per assegurar l'existència de mostres negatives efectives en cada lote. A través de tres conjunts de dades QA de domini obert, el nostre mètode supera consistentment una forta base de recuperació densa que utilitza 6 vegades més computació per a l'entrenament. En dos dels conjunts de dades, el nostre mètode aconsegueix millora absoluta de més de 4 punts en termes de resposta exacta.", 'fi': 'Yleisesti käytetyt tiedonhakumenetelmät, kuten TF-IDF avoimissa kysymyksissä (QA) -järjestelmissä, eivät riitä kuvaamaan syvää semanttista vastaamista, joka ylittää leksikaaliset päällekkäisyydet. Joidenkin viimeaikaisten tutkimusten mukaan hakuprosessi on maksimaalinen sisäinen tuotehaku (MIPS), jossa käytetään tiheitä kysymys- ja kappaleesityksiä, mikä tuottaa lupaavia tuloksia useissa tietohakuisissa laadunvarmistustiedoissa. Tiheiden vektoriesitysten esikoulutus on kuitenkin erittäin resurssivaatimuksta vaativaa, esimerkiksi se vaatii erittäin suuren erän kokoa ja paljon harjoitusvaiheita. Tässä työssä ehdotamme näytetehokasta menetelmää kappalekooderin esikoulutukseen. Ensin sen sijaan, että käyttäisimme heuristisesti luotuja pseudo-kysymys-kappalepareja esikoulutukseen, käytämme olemassa olevaa esikoulutettua sekvenssimallia rakentaaksemme vahvan kysymyksen generaattorin, joka luo korkealaatuista esikoulutustietoa. Toiseksi ehdotamme yksinkertaista progressiivista esikoulutusalgoritmia varmistaaksemme tehokkaiden negatiivisten näytteiden olemassaolon kussakin erässä. Kolmessa avoimen verkkotunnuksen laadunvarmistustiedossa menetelmämme suoriutuu johdonmukaisesti voimakkaan tiheän haun perusaikataulun, joka käyttää harjoitteluun 6 kertaa enemmän laskentaa. Kahdessa aineistossa menetelmämme saavuttaa yli 4 pisteen absoluuttisen parannuksen vastaustarkkuuden suhteen.', 'he': 'Commonly used information retrieval methods such as TF-IDF in open-domain question answering (QA) systems are insufficient to capture deep semantic matching that goes beyond lexical overlaps.  Some recent studies consider the retrieval process as maximum inner product search (MIPS) using dense question and paragraph representations, achieving promising results on several information-seeking QA datasets.  בכל אופן, המחזור של מיצוגי הוקטורים הצפויים דורשים משאבים רבים, לדוגמא, דורש גודל גדול מאוד במחלקה והרבה צעדים של אימון. In this work, we propose a sample-efficient method to pretrain the paragraph encoder.  First, instead of using heuristically created pseudo question-paragraph pairs for pretraining, we use an existing pretrained sequence-to-sequence model to build a strong question generator that creates high-quality pretraining data.  שנית, אנו מציעים אלגוריתם חד-מתקדם קדימי כדי להבטיח את קיומו של דגימות שליליות יעילות בכל מחלקה. במהלך שלושה קבוצות מידע QA של שטח פתוח, השיטה שלנו ביצעה באופן קבוע מעבר לבסיס חיפוש צפוף חזק שמשתמש בחשבון 6 פעמים יותר לאימון. בשני מסמכי הנתונים, השיטה שלנו משיגה יותר מ-4 נקודות שיפור מוחלט במונחים של התאמה בדיוק.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Babu wasu fitina na da suka sani a lokacin da za'a yi amfani da tambayi mai nau'i da kuma rubutu, suna sami matsala masu yiwuwa da ake yi wa alkawari a sami'a masu motsi na QA. A lokacin da, misãlan dai, ya ƙayyade manyan tsayi masu hushi mai girma na tambayar ma'auni mai girma, misali, yana da ƙayyade girgije mai girma na batch da hanyoyi masu ƙaranci. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buƙata wani metode mai amfani da misãlai ko da za'a kiyaye kodi na tababar. Kayyan, an a amfani da amfani da heuristically ya halitta nau'i-par-parse ga preraining, za mu yi amfani da wani misali wanda ya kasance a gaba, wa'anar dacewa-sequence zuwa-sequence, dõmin ya ƙiƙira wani mai ƙarfi wa tambayar ta zaɓe-sifatin-sifatida. Dukkan na, Muke buƙata wani marubuci mai sauƙi a gaba ga raina algoritm dõmin Mu hakar da misãlai masu inganci cikin kõwace batch. Ko cikin tsarin QA da aka buɗe kwamfyuta uku, metoden mu na ƙara kodi yana mai cikakken cewa mai ƙarfi wanda ke yi amfani da lissafi 6 sau biyu dõmin yin amfani da shi. Daga biyu na daidaita zaɓani, metodenmu yana sãmun mafiya kyau a ƙari duk point 4 cikin maganar ajiya daidai.", 'bo': 'Commonly used information retrieval methods such as TF-IDF in open-domain question answering (QA) systems are insufficient to capture deep semantic matching that goes beyond lexical overlaps. Some recent studies consider the retrieval process as maximum inner product search (MIPS) using dense question and paragraph representations, achieving promising results on several information-seeking QA datasets. ཡིན་ནའང་། ཁག་ཆེ་དག་གི་སྔོན་ལྟར་ངེས་པར་ཆས་པ་ཞིག་དགོས་པ་ཡིན། དཔེར་ན། རྩ་བ་ཆེ་བའི་ཞེང་ཚད་དང་སྒྲུབ་གྲྭར་མང་ཆེ་དག ང་ཚོས་ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་བཀོད་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་པ་ཞིག་གིས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གསལ་བཀོད་པ་དང་། First, instead of using heuristically created pseudo question-paragraph pairs for pretraining, we use an existing pretrained sequence-to-sequence model to build a strong question generator that creates high-quality pretraining data. གཉིས་པ། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་རྣམ་པ་རེ་བ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཡོད་པ་དང་། Across three open-domain QA datasets, our method consistently outperforms a strong dense retrieval baseline that uses 6 times more computation for training. ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གནད་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བྱས་མིན་འདུག', 'jv': 'UnknownMonitor vendor Algorithm politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang barêng-barêng, kita unhéweke samplin-effek uwong nggawe pararampung koder. Awak dhéwé, kabèh nambah heuristik nggawe pseudhakan-paragraph kuwing nggawe gerakan, awak dhéwé nambah layanan sekondirne-to-sekondirne soko nggawe sistem sing berangatus surat sing paling nggawe uwong Yosegondé, kita supoyo akeh perusahaan Algorithm iso dianggawe barang nggawe access Mungkin duruha dataset, kita gambar perusahaan tanggal 4 puntuan langgar mau', 'sk': 'Pogosto uporabljene metode pridobivanja informacij, kot je TF-IDF v sistemih odprtega domena za odgovarjanje na vprašanja (QA), ne zadostujejo za zajem globokega semantičnega ujemanja, ki presega leksikalna prekrivanja. Nekatere nedavne študije obravnavajo proces iskanja kot maksimalno notranje iskanje izdelkov (MIPS), ki uporablja goste predstavitve vprašanj in odstavkov, s čimer se dosežejo obetavni rezultati na več naborih podatkov o kakovosti, ki iščejo informacije. Vendar pa je predtreniranje gostih vektorskih predstavitev zelo zahtevno z viri, npr. zahteva zelo veliko velikost serije in veliko korakov usposabljanja. V tem delu predlagamo vzorčno učinkovito metodo za predvajanje odstavkovnega kodirja. Prvič, namesto uporabe heuristično ustvarjenih parov psevdo vprašanj-odstavkov za predtreniranje, uporabljamo obstoječ predtreniran model zaporedja do zaporedja za izdelavo močnega generatorja vprašanj, ki ustvarja visokokakovostne predtrenirane podatke. Drugič, predlagamo preprost progresivni algoritem predtreninga za zagotovitev obstoja učinkovitih negativnih vzorcev v vsaki seriji. V treh naborih podatkov o kakovosti z odprto domeno naša metoda dosledno presega močno gosto osnovno izhodišče za pridobivanje, ki za usposabljanje uporablja šestkrat več izračunov. Na dveh naborih podatkov naša metoda doseže več kot 4-točkovno absolutno izboljšanje v smislu natančnega ujemanja odgovorov.'}
{'en': 'Exploring the Limits of Few-Shot Link Prediction in Knowledge Graphs', 'fr': 'Exploration des limites de la prédiction de liens à faible dose dans les graphes de connaissances', 'es': 'Exploración de los límites de la predicción de enlaces de pocos disparos en gráficos de conocimiento', 'ar': 'استكشاف حدود توقع روابط قليلة اللقطات في الرسوم البيانية المعرفية', 'pt': 'Explorando os limites da previsão de links de poucos disparos em gráficos de conhecimento', 'hi': 'ज्ञान रेखांकन में कुछ शॉट लिंक भविष्यवाणी की सीमाओं की खोज', 'ja': 'ナレッジグラフにおける少ないショットリンク予測の限界を探る', 'zh': '探图谱中少发链接占之局限性', 'ru': 'Изучение пределов предсказания по нескольким выстрелам в графиках знаний', 'ga': 'Iniúchadh ar Theorainneacha Réamhthuar Naisc Mhion Urchar i nGrafanna Eolais', 'ka': 'პატარა პატარა კონფიგურაციის წინასწორება', 'el': 'Εξερευνώντας τα όρια της πρόβλεψης ελάχιστων δεσμών σε γραφήματα γνώσης', 'hu': 'A néhány lövéses kapcsolat-előrejelzés korlátainak feltárása a tudásgrafokban', 'it': 'Esplorare i limiti della previsione dei collegamenti in pochi scatti nei grafici della conoscenza', 'lt': 'Išnagrinėti kelių nuotraukų sąsajų prognozės ribas žinių grafikuose', 'mk': 'Истражување на ограничувањата на предвидувањата за неколку слики врски во графиците на знаење', 'mt': 'L-esplorazzjoni tal-limiti tat-tbassir ta’ rabtiet bi ftit skossi fl-Grafiki tal-Għarfien', 'ms': 'Exploring the Limits of Few-Shot Link Prediction in Knowledge Graphs', 'ml': 'അറിവുള്ള ഗ്രാഫ്സില്\u200d കുറച്ച് ചെറുതായി സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്ന ലിങ്കിന്റെ പരിധികള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Мэдлэг графикийн жижиг холбоотой холбоотой хязгаарыг судлах', 'no': 'Utforskar grensene for få skytte lenkjeforhåndsvising i kjennende grafikk', 'pl': 'Odkrywanie granic prognozowania niewielkich łączy w wykresach wiedzy', 'ro': 'Explorarea limitelor predicției legăturilor cu puține fotografii în graficele de cunoaștere', 'kk': 'Білім графикаларындағы кішкентай сілтеменің шектерін зерттеу', 'so': 'Limits of Few-Shot Preferences in Scientific Graphs', 'sv': 'Att utforska gränserna för förutsägelse av länkar med några skott i kunskapsgrafer', 'ta': 'அறிவிப்பு வரைப்படங்களில் குறைந்தபட்ச இணைப்பு முன்னுரிமையின் எல்லைகளை ஏற்றுகிறது', 'si': 'Name', 'sr': 'Ispitivanje ograničenja malog pogođenja veze u znanstvenim graficama', 'ur': 'علم گراف میں کم شلیک لینک کی محدودیت کا تحقیق کرتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Khám phá giới hạn của đoán liên kết thoáng trong đồ họa về tri thức', 'da': 'Udforsk grænserne for forudsigelse af link med få skud i vidensgrafer', 'nl': 'Het verkennen van de grenzen van Few-Shot Link Prediction in kennisgrafieken', 'bg': 'Изследване на границите на прогнозирането на линкове с няколко снимки в графиките на знанието', 'id': 'Exploring the Limits of Few-Shot Link Prediction in Knowledge Graphs', 'hr': 'Ispitivanje ograničenja malog pogodaka veze u znanstvenim graficama', 'de': 'Erforschung der Grenzen von Few-Shot-Link-Vorhersagen in Wissensgrafiken', 'ko': '탐색 지식도에서 소렌즈 링크 예측의 한계', 'sw': 'Kuelezea Mipaka ya Uunganishaji Chache Shot Dilution in Sayansi', 'sq': 'Exploring the Limits of Few-Shot Link Prediction in Knowledge Graphs', 'am': 'Exploring the Limits of Few-Shot Link Prediction in Knowledge Graphs', 'hy': 'Գիտելու գրաֆիկներում մի քանի լուսանկարների հնարավորությունների ուսումնասիրելը', 'az': 'Bilim Grafikl…ôrind…ô az vuruŇü bańülantńĪsńĪnńĪn sńĪnńĪrlarńĪnńĪ t…ôsdiql…ôyici', 'bn': 'জ্ঞান গ্রাফের মধ্যে অল্প-শুট লিঙ্কের সীমা বিশ্লেষণ করা হচ্ছে', 'tr': 'Bilgi Graflarda az-täze baglaýyşyň sözlerini bejermek', 'bs': 'Ispitivanje ograničenja malog pogodaka veze u znanstvenim grafovima', 'af': "Voorskou die grense van 'n paar skoot skakel voorskou in kennis Grafies", 'fa': 'تحقیق محدودیت پیشنهاد ارتباط کمی در گرافهای دانش', 'cs': 'Prozkoumání limitů předpovědi několika vztahů ve znalostních grafech', 'et': 'Vähese pildi lingi prognoosimise piiride uurimine teadmisgraafikutes', 'fi': 'Muutaman kuvan linkin ennusteen rajojen tutkiminen tietokaavioissa', 'ca': "Explorar els límits de la predicció d'enllaços poc fotografiats en gràfics del coneixement", 'sk': 'Raziskovanje omejitev napovedi povezav s kratkimi posnetki v grafikonih znanja', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Gebagi pernik limiting of Few-shot Link', 'bo': 'ཤེས་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ནང་དུ་ཉེ་ཆུང་བའི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ཀྱི་ཚད་གཞི་བཙལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ', 'he': 'לחקור את הגבולות של צילום קטנים של צילומים של חיבורים בגרפי ידע'}
{'en': 'Real-world knowledge graphs are often characterized by low-frequency relationsa challenge that has prompted an increasing interest in few-shot link prediction methods. These methods perform link prediction for a set of new relations, unseen during training, given only a few example facts of each relation at test time. In this work, we perform a systematic study on a spectrum of models derived by generalizing the current state of the art for few-shot link prediction, with the goal of probing the limits of learning in this few-shot setting. We find that a simple, zero-shot baseline   which ignores any relation-specific information   achieves surprisingly strong performance. Moreover, experiments on carefully crafted synthetic datasets show that having only a few examples of a relation fundamentally limits models from using fine-grained structural information and only allows for exploiting the coarse-grained positional information of entities. Together, our findings challenge the implicit assumptions and inductive biases of prior work and highlight new directions for research in this area.', 'ar': 'غالبًا ما تتميز الرسوم البيانية المعرفية في العالم الحقيقي بعلاقات منخفضة التردد - وهو تحد أدى إلى زيادة الاهتمام بأساليب التنبؤ بالوصلة قليلة اللقطات. تؤدي هذه الأساليب التنبؤ بالرابط لمجموعة من العلاقات الجديدة ، غير المرئية أثناء التدريب ، مع إعطاء أمثلة قليلة فقط من حقائق كل علاقة في وقت الاختبار. في هذا العمل ، نجري دراسة منهجية على مجموعة من النماذج المشتقة من خلال تعميم الحالة الفنية الحالية للتنبؤ بالوصلة قليلة اللقطات ، بهدف التحقق من حدود التعلم في هذا الإعداد قليل اللقطات. لقد وجدنا أن خط الأساس البسيط الذي لا يمكن إطلاقه - والذي يتجاهل أي معلومات خاصة بالعلاقة - يحقق أداءً قويًا بشكل مدهش. علاوة على ذلك ، تُظهر التجارب على مجموعات البيانات التركيبية المصممة بعناية أن وجود أمثلة قليلة فقط من العلاقة يحد بشكل أساسي من النماذج من استخدام المعلومات الهيكلية الدقيقة ويسمح فقط باستغلال المعلومات الموضعية الدقيقة للكيانات. معًا ، تتحدى النتائج التي توصلنا إليها الافتراضات الضمنية والتحيزات الاستقرائية للعمل السابق وتسليط الضوء على اتجاهات جديدة للبحث في هذا المجال.', 'pt': 'Os grafos de conhecimento do mundo real são frequentemente caracterizados por relações de baixa frequência - um desafio que gerou um interesse crescente em métodos de previsão de links de poucos disparos. Esses métodos realizam previsão de link para um conjunto de novas relações, não vistas durante o treinamento, dados apenas alguns fatos de exemplo de cada relação no momento do teste. Neste trabalho, realizamos um estudo sistemático sobre um espectro de modelos derivados da generalização do atual estado da arte para previsão de links de poucos disparos, com o objetivo de sondar os limites do aprendizado nesse cenário de poucos disparos. Descobrimos que uma linha de base simples e de tiro zero – que ignora qualquer informação específica da relação – alcança um desempenho surpreendentemente forte. Além disso, experimentos em conjuntos de dados sintéticos cuidadosamente elaborados mostram que ter apenas alguns exemplos de uma relação limita fundamentalmente os modelos de usar informações estruturais refinadas e permite apenas explorar as informações posicionais de granularidade grosseira das entidades. Juntas, nossas descobertas desafiam as suposições implícitas e os vieses indutivos de trabalhos anteriores e destacam novas direções para a pesquisa nessa área.', 'fr': "Les graphes de connaissances du monde réel sont souvent caractérisés par des relations à basse fréquence, un défi qui a suscité un intérêt croissant pour les méthodes de prédiction de liens à faible fréquence. Ces méthodes réalisent une prédiction de lien pour un ensemble de nouvelles relations, invisibles pendant l'entraînement, en ne tenant compte que de quelques exemples de faits de chaque relation au moment du test. Dans ce travail, nous effectuons une étude systématique d'un éventail de modèles dérivés en généralisant l'état actuel de l'art pour la prédiction de liens en quelques coups, dans le but de sonder les limites de l'apprentissage dans ce contexte de quelques coups. Nous constatons qu'une base de référence simple et zéro — qui ignore toute information spécifique à la relation — permet d'obtenir des performances étonnamment élevées. De plus, des expériences sur des ensembles de données synthétiques soigneusement conçus montrent que le fait de n'avoir que quelques exemples de relation limite fondamentalement les modèles à utiliser des informations structurales fines et ne permet d'exploiter que les informations de position grossières des entités. Ensemble, nos résultats remettent en question les hypothèses implicites et les biais inductifs des travaux antérieurs et mettent en évidence de nouvelles orientations de recherche dans ce domaine.", 'es': 'Los gráficos de conocimiento del mundo real a menudo se caracterizan por relaciones de baja frecuencia, un desafío que ha despertado un interés creciente en los métodos de predicción de enlaces de pocos disparos. Estos métodos realizan la predicción de enlaces para un conjunto de nuevas relaciones, que no se ven durante el entrenamiento, dados solo unos pocos ejemplos de hechos de cada relación en el momento de la prueba. En este trabajo, realizamos un estudio sistemático sobre un espectro de modelos derivados de la generalización del estado actual de la técnica para la predicción de enlaces de pocos disparos, con el objetivo de sondear los límites del aprendizaje en este entorno de pocos disparos. Descubrimos que una línea de base simple y cero, que ignora cualquier información específica de la relación, logra un rendimiento sorprendentemente sólido. Además, los experimentos en conjuntos de datos sintéticos cuidadosamente elaborados muestran que tener solo unos pocos ejemplos de una relación limita fundamentalmente el uso de información estructural detallada de los modelos y solo permite explotar la información posicional gruesa de las entidades. Juntos, nuestros hallazgos desafían las suposiciones implícitas y los sesgos inductivos de trabajos anteriores y destacan nuevas direcciones para la investigación en esta área.', 'ja': '現実の知識グラフは、しばしば低周波の関係によって特徴づけられる。この課題は、数ショットリンク予測方法への関心を高めるきっかけとなった。 これらの方法は、トレーニング中に見えない一連の新しい関係のリンク予測を実行し、テスト時に各関係のいくつかの例の事実のみを与えます。 本研究では，この少ないショットでの学習の限界を探ることを目標に，少ないショットリンク予測のための現状を一般化して導き出されるモデルのスペクトルについて体系的な研究を行っている． 関係固有の情報を無視したシンプルでゼロショットのベースラインは、驚くほど強力なパフォーマンスを達成していることがわかります。 さらに、慎重に作成された合成データセットの実験は、関係のいくつかの例のみを持つことは、モデルが細かい構造情報を使用することを根本的に制限し、エンティティの粗い粒度の位置情報を利用することのみを可能にすることを示しています。 私たちの調査結果は、以前の仕事の暗黙の前提と帰納的バイアスに共に挑戦し、この分野の研究の新しい方向性を強調しています。', 'hi': 'वास्तविक दुनिया के ज्ञान रेखांकन को अक्सर कम आवृत्ति वाले संबंधों की विशेषता होती है- एक चुनौती जिसने कुछ-शॉट लिंक भविष्यवाणी विधियों में बढ़ती रुचि को प्रेरित किया है। ये विधियां नए संबंधों के एक सेट के लिए लिंक भविष्यवाणी करती हैं, प्रशिक्षण के दौरान अनदेखी, परीक्षण के समय प्रत्येक संबंध के केवल कुछ उदाहरण तथ्यों को देखते हुए। इस काम में, हम कुछ-शॉट लिंक भविष्यवाणी के लिए कला की वर्तमान स्थिति को सामान्यीकृत करके व्युत्पन्न मॉडल के स्पेक्ट्रम पर एक व्यवस्थित अध्ययन करते हैं, इस कुछ-शॉट सेटिंग में सीखने की सीमाओं की जांच करने के लक्ष्य के साथ। हम पाते हैं कि एक सरल, शून्य-शॉट बेसलाइन - जो किसी भी संबंध-विशिष्ट जानकारी को अनदेखा करता है - आश्चर्यजनक रूप से मजबूत प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है। इसके अलावा, सावधानीपूर्वक तैयार किए गए सिंथेटिक डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि एक संबंध के केवल कुछ उदाहरण होने से मॉडल को मौलिक रूप से ठीक-ठाक संरचनात्मक जानकारी का उपयोग करने से सीमित कर दिया जाता है और केवल संस्थाओं की मोटे-दाने वाली स्थितिगत जानकारी का शोषण करने की अनुमति मिलती है। साथ में, हमारे निष्कर्ष पूर्व कार्य की अंतर्निहित मान्यताओं और आगमनात्मक पूर्वाग्रहों को चुनौती देते हैं और इस क्षेत्र में अनुसंधान के लिए नई दिशाओं को उजागर करते हैं।', 'zh': '世界之知图谱常以低频为征,此挑战促人小概率链接之趣日厚。 其法链接占,不见于训练之间,试时仅数示例事实。 凡此诸事,少加链接占技术水平而得一系,原其小镜头置之极也。 一简一发基线 - 忽特定信息 - 可讶强大能。 此外精心制作合成数集之实验,惟数事示例限以细粒度结,但许用实体粗粒度位信息。 赞曰∶见前隐而纳偏,显而新之。', 'ru': 'Графики знаний в реальном мире часто характеризуются низкочастотными отношениями - задача, которая вызвала растущий интерес к методам предсказания с несколькими каналами. Эти методы выполняют предсказание связей для набора новых отношений, невидимых во время обучения, приводя лишь несколько примеров каждого отношения во время тестирования. В этой работе мы проводим систематическое исследование спектра моделей, полученных путем обобщения современного состояния для предсказания коротких линий связи, с целью зондирования пределов обучения в этой ситуации с несколькими линиями связи. Мы обнаружили, что простая базовая линия с нулевым выстрелом, которая игнорирует любую информацию, относящуюся к конкретным отношениям, достигает удивительно высокой производительности. Кроме того, эксперименты с тщательно составленными синтетическими наборами данных показывают, что наличие лишь нескольких примеров соотношения фундаментально ограничивает модели от использования мелкозернистой структурной информации и позволяет использовать только грубозернистую позиционную информацию сущностей. Вместе наши выводы ставят под сомнение неявные предположения и индуктивные ошибки предыдущей работы и выделяют новые направления для исследований в этой области.', 'ga': 'Is minic a bhíonn caidreamh ísealmhinicíochta ag baint le graif eolais ón bhfíorshaol – dúshlán a spreag spéis mhéadaithe i modhanna réamh-mheastacháin ar bheagán seat. Déanann na modhanna seo nasc a thuar le haghaidh sraith de chaidreamh nua, nach bhfacthas riamh roimhe le linn na hoiliúna, gan ach cúpla sampla de fhíorais a thabhairt de gach gaol ag am tástála. Sa saothar seo, déanaimid staidéar córasach ar speictream samhlacha a dhíorthaítear trí staid reatha na healaíne a ghinearálú le haghaidh naisc chúpla seat a thuar, agus é mar sprioc teorainneacha na foghlama a fhiosrú sa suíomh cúpla seat seo. Faighimid amach go mbaineann bonnlíne simplí, náid – a thugann neamhaird ar aon fhaisnéis a bhaineann go sonrach leis – feidhmíocht iontach láidir. Ina theannta sin, taispeánann turgnaimh ar thacair shonraí shintéiseacha atá déanta go cúramach, mura bhfuil ach roinnt samplaí de chaidreamh ann, cuireann sé srian bunúsach ar mhúnlaí úsáid a bhaint as faisnéis struchtúrach mhínghlanta agus nach gceadaítear sin ach leas a bhaint as faisnéis gharbh-shuímh na n-eintiteas. Le chéile, tugann ár dtorthaí dúshlán do na boinn tuisceana intuigthe agus do laofachtaí ionduchtaithe na hoibre roimhe seo agus leagann siad béim ar threoracha nua taighde sa réimse seo.', 'el': 'Τα γραφήματα γνώσης του πραγματικού κόσμου συχνά χαρακτηρίζονται από σχέσεις χαμηλής συχνότητας – μια πρόκληση που έχει προκαλέσει αυξανόμενο ενδιαφέρον για μεθόδους πρόβλεψης συνδέσεων ελάχιστων πυροβολισμών. Αυτές οι μέθοδοι εκτελούν πρόβλεψη σύνδεσης για ένα σύνολο νέων σχέσεων, μη ορατών κατά τη διάρκεια της εκπαίδευσης, δίνοντάς μόνο μερικά παραδείγματα γεγονότων για κάθε σχέση κατά τη διάρκεια της δοκιμής. Στην παρούσα εργασία, διεξάγουμε μια συστηματική μελέτη σε ένα φάσμα μοντέλων που προέρχονται από τη γενίκευση της τρέχουσας κατάστασης της τεχνολογίας για την πρόβλεψη συνδέσεων λίγων πυροβολισμών, με στόχο την διερεύνηση των ορίων της μάθησης σε αυτό το σκηνικό λίγων πυροβολισμών. Βρίσκουμε ότι μια απλή, μηδενική γραμμή βάσης που αγνοεί κάθε πληροφορία που σχετίζεται με τη σχέση επιτυγχάνει εκπληκτικά ισχυρή απόδοση. Επιπλέον, πειράματα σε προσεκτικά κατασκευασμένα συνθετικά σύνολα δεδομένων δείχνουν ότι η ύπαρξη μόνο μερικών παραδειγμάτων μιας σχέσης περιορίζει ουσιαστικά τα μοντέλα από τη χρήση λεπτόκοκκων δομικών πληροφοριών και επιτρέπει μόνο την εκμετάλλευση των χονδρόκοκκων πληροφοριών θέσης των οντοτήτων. Μαζί, τα ευρήματά μας αμφισβητούν τις σιωπηρές παραδοχές και τις επαγωγικές προκαταλήψεις προηγούμενων εργασιών και αναδεικνύουν νέες κατευθύνσεις έρευνας στον τομέα αυτό.', 'hu': 'A valós világ ismereteinek grafikonjait gyakran alacsony frekvenciájú kapcsolatok jellemzik – ez a kihívás egyre nagyobb érdeklődést váltott ki a kevés lövéses kapcsolat előrejelzési módszerek iránt. Ezek a módszerek kapcsolat-előrejelzést végeznek egy sor új kapcsolatra, amelyek nem láthatók az edzés során, csak néhány példa alapján minden kapcsolat tesztidőben. Ebben a munkában szisztematikus tanulmányt végzünk a néhány lövéses kapcsolat-előrejelzés aktuális állapotának általánosításával származó modellek spektrumáról, azzal a céllal, hogy ebben a néhány lövéses környezetben felmérjük a tanulás korlátait. Úgy találjuk, hogy egy egyszerű, nulla lövéses alap - amely figyelmen kívül hagyja a kapcsolat-specifikus információkat - meglepően erős teljesítményt ér el. Továbbá a gondosan kidolgozott szintetikus adatkészletekkel végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a kapcsolat csak néhány példája alapvetően korlátozza a modelleket a finom szemű strukturális információk használatától, és csak az entitások durva szemű helyzeti információinak kihasználását teszi lehetővé. Eredményeink együttesen vitatják a korábbi munkák implicit feltételezéseit és induktív előítéleteit, és kiemelik az ezen a területen folytatott kutatások új irányait.', 'it': "I grafici della conoscenza del mondo reale sono spesso caratterizzati da relazioni a bassa frequenza, una sfida che ha suscitato un crescente interesse per i metodi di previsione dei collegamenti a pochi colpi. Questi metodi eseguono la previsione del collegamento per un insieme di nuove relazioni, invisibili durante l'allenamento, dando solo alcuni esempi di fatti di ogni relazione al momento della prova. In questo lavoro, eseguiamo uno studio sistematico su uno spettro di modelli derivati generalizzando lo stato attuale dell'arte per la previsione dei collegamenti a pochi colpi, con l'obiettivo di sondare i limiti dell'apprendimento in questo setting a pochi colpi. Troviamo che una linea di base semplice, zero shot - che ignora qualsiasi informazione specifica di relazione - raggiunge prestazioni sorprendentemente forti. Inoltre, esperimenti su set di dati sintetici accuratamente realizzati mostrano che avere solo pochi esempi di relazione limita fondamentalmente i modelli dall'utilizzare informazioni strutturali a grana fine e consente solo di sfruttare le informazioni posizionali a grana grossa delle entità. Insieme, i nostri risultati sfidano le ipotesi implicite e i pregiudizi induttivi del lavoro precedente e evidenziano nuove direzioni per la ricerca in questo settore.", 'lt': 'Real-world knowledge graphs are often characterized by low-frequency relations-a challenge that has prompted an increasing interest in few-shot link prediction methods.  Šie metodai atlieka naujų santykių, kurie mokymo metu nepastebimi, sąsajų prognozę, atsižvelgiant į tik keletą kiekvieno santykio pavyzdžių bandymo metu. In this work, we perform a systematic study on a spectrum of models derived by generalizing the current state of the art for few-shot link prediction, with the goal of probing the limits of learning in this few-shot setting.  We find that a simple, zero-shot baseline - which ignores any relation-specific information - achieves surprisingly strong performance.  Moreover, experiments on carefully crafted synthetic datasets show that having only a few examples of a relation fundamentally limits models from using fine-grained structural information and only allows for exploiting the coarse-grained positional information of entities.  Together, our findings challenge the implicit assumptions and inductive biases of prior work and highlight new directions for research in this area.', 'ms': 'Graf pengetahuan dunia nyata sering dikaraterisasikan oleh hubungan frekuensi rendah-satu cabaran yang telah memicu kepentingan meningkat dalam kaedah ramalan pautan-beberapa tembakan. Kaedah ini melaksanakan ramalan pautan untuk set hubungan baru, tidak terlihat semasa latihan, diberikan hanya beberapa contoh fakta setiap hubungan pada masa ujian. Dalam kerja ini, kami melakukan kajian sistemik pada spektrum model yang dihasilkan dengan menggeneralisasi keadaan seni semasa untuk ramalan pautan beberapa tembakan, dengan tujuan untuk menguji had belajar dalam seting beberapa tembakan ini. Kami mendapati bahawa dasar yang mudah, 0-shot - yang mengabaikan mana-mana maklumat relatif-spesifik - mencapai prestasi yang mengejutkan kuat. Lagipun, eksperimen pada set data sintetik yang dibuat dengan berhati-hati menunjukkan bahawa hanya mempunyai beberapa contoh hubungan secara dasar mengatasi model daripada menggunakan maklumat struktur berubah gandum dan hanya membenarkan untuk mengeksploitasi maklumat kedudukan berubah gandum entiti. Together, our findings challenge the implicit assumptions and inductive biases of prior work and highlight new directions for research in this area.', 'ml': 'ശരിക്കും ലോകത്തിലെ അറിവുകളുടെ ഗ്രാഫുകള്\u200d എപ്പോഴും കുറച്ച് സമയമായി കുറച്ച് ഫ്രെയിന്\u200dസ് ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d കുറച്ച് വെടിയുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു.  ഈ രീതികള്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ഓരോ ബന്ധത്തിന്റെയും കുറച്ച് ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d മാത്രമേ കൊടുത്തുള്ളൂ. ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സിസ്റ്റമിക്ക് പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ഈ കുറച്ച് വെടിവെച്ച് പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പരിധികള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ലക്ഷ്യ We find that a simple, zero-shot baseline - which ignores any relation-specific information - achieves surprisingly strong performance.  Moreover, experiments on carefully crafted synthetic datasets show that having only a few examples of a relation fundamentally limits models from using fine-grained structural information and only allows for exploiting the coarse-grained positional information of entities.  ഒരുമിച്ച്, നമ്മുടെ കണ്ടുപിടികള്\u200d ഈ പ്രദേശത്തിലെ പഠനത്തിന്റെ പുതിയ മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വ്യത്യാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഊഹികങ്ങള', 'kk': 'Шынымен әлемдегі білім графиктері көбінесе төмен жиілік қатынастарынан таңдайды. Бұл әлемдегі бақылау сілтемелердің бақылау әдістерін көбінесе көбінесе көбінесе қатынастарының кө Бұл әдістер жаңа қатынастарды бақылау кезінде көрсетілмеген жаңа қатынастар үшін сілтемелерді бақылауға арналған, тек сынақтар уақытында әрбір қатынастың бірнеше мысал фа Бұл жұмыс ішінде, біз бірнеше шарлық сілтемелерді бақылау үшін бірнеше сілтеменің күйін жалғастырып, оқыту шектерінің шектерін тексеру мақсатымыз жүйелік зерттеуді жасаймыз. Біз қарапайым, нөл шектердің негізгі сызығы - барлық қатынастық мәліметті елемейді - әлі күшті істеу үшін күшті болады. Сонымен қатар, синтетикалық деректер жиындарының тәжірибелері тек бірнеше мәселелерін негізгі түрлі құрылған құрылғы мәліметін қолдану үшін қатынастың шектеу үлгілерін тек бірнеше мәліметі болады, және тек бірліктерд Бірақ табуларымыз бұл аумақтағы зерттеу үшін жаңа бағыттарды таңдау үшін алдыңғы жұмыс жұмысының негізгі тапсырмаларын және индективті тапсырмаларын өзгертеді.', 'mk': 'Графите за знаење на реалниот свет честопати се карактеризирани со релативни односи со ниска фреквенција - предизвик кој предизвика зголемен интерес за методите за предвидување на неколку снимки врски. These methods perform link prediction for a set of new relations, unseen during training, given only a few example facts of each relation at test time.  Во оваа работа, спроведуваме систематска студија на спектар на модели изведени со генерализација на сегашната техничка состојба за предвидување на неколку снимки врски, со цел да ги провериме границите на учењето во ова неколку снимки. Најдовме дека едноставната основа со нула стрела - која ги игнорира сите информации специфични за односите - постигнува изненадувачки силни резултати. Покрај тоа, експериментите на внимателно создадени синтетички податоци покажуваат дека имањето само неколку примери на однос фундаментално ги ограничува моделите од употребата на фини структурни информации и овозможува само искористување на груби позиционални информации на ентитетите. Заедно, нашите откритија ги предизвикуваат имплицитните претпоставувања и индуктивните предрасуди на претходната работа и ги истакнуваат новите насоки за истражување во оваа област.', 'mt': "Grafiki tal-għarfien fid-dinja reali ta’ spiss huma kkaratterizzati minn relazzjonijiet ta’ frekwenza baxxa – sfida li wasslet għal interess dejjem akbar f’metodi ta’ tbassir ta’ konnessjonijiet b’ftit skopijiet. These methods perform link prediction for a set of new relations, unseen during training, given only a few example facts of each relation at test time.  F’dan ix-xogħol, nagħmlu studju sistematiku dwar spettru ta’ mudelli derivati billi nġeneralizzaw l-istat attwali tal-a ħħar għal tbassir ta’ konnessjonijiet b’ftit fotografiji, bil-għan li jinstabu l-limiti tat-tagħlim f’dan l-ambjent b’ftit fotografiji. Aħna nsibu li linja bażi sempliċi u mingħajr skopijiet - li tinjora kwalunkwe informazzjoni speċifika għar-relazzjoni - tikseb prestazzjoni b'saħħitha b'mod sorprendenti. Barra minn hekk, l-esperimenti fuq settijiet ta’ dejta sintetiċi maħduma bir-reqqa juru li jekk wieħed ikollu biss ftit eżempji ta’ relazzjoni fundamentalment jillimita l-mudelli mill-użu ta’ informazzjoni strutturali bi ħbub irfinat u jippermetti biss l-isfruttar tal-informazzjoni pożizzjonali bi ħbub irfinat tal-entitajiet. Flimkien, is-sejbiet tagħna jisfidaw is-suppożizzjonijiet impliċiti u l-preġudizzji induttivi tax-xogħol preċedenti u jenfasizzaw direzzjonijiet ġodda għar-riċerka f’dan il-qasam.", 'mn': 'Бодит ертөнцийн мэдлэг график нь ихэвчлэн бага хэмжээний харилцааныг харуулдаг. Энэ асуудал нь цөөн хэмжээний холбоотой холбоотой таамаглалтын аргыг илүү их сонирхолтой болгодог. Эдгээр арга нь шинэ харилцааны хувьд холбогдол хийдэг. Сургуулийн үед харилцааны тухай хэд хэдэн жишээ л байдаг. Энэ ажлын тухай бид урлагийн орчин үеийн тодорхойлолтой хэд хэдэн зурагтай холбоотой тодорхойлолтой хэмжээний хязгаарыг судлах зорилго дээр систематик судалгаа хийдэг. Бид энгийн, тэгш шулууны суурь шулуун олж мэднэ. Энэ нь ямар ч харилцааны тодорхой мэдээллийг эсэргүүцдэг. Гайхалтай хүчтэй үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг. Үүнээс хамааралтай хэд хэдэн жишээг багасгаж байхад зөвхөн багасгасан бүтэц мэдээллийг ашиглахаас холбогдох боломжтой байдаг. Хамтдаа бидний олж мэдсэн зүйлс нь өмнөх ажлын тухай үндсэн үзэл, сэтгэл хөдлөл, судалгааны шинэ замыг тодорхойлдог.', 'no': 'Grafikk for kunnskap frå verden er ofte karakterisert av låg frekvensrelasjonar - eit utfordring som har førte til å økja interesse på metodar for å foreslå lenkje frå få bilete. Desse metodane utfører lenkjeforhåndsvising for eit sett nye relasjonar, ukjend under opplæring, gjev berre nokre eksempel faktar for kvar relasjon ved testtid. I denne arbeiden utfører vi eit systematisk studie på eit spektrum av modeller som gjeld ved å generalisera den gjeldande tilstanden til kunsten for forebygging av få bilete, med målet å prøve grensene for læring i denne få bilete innstillinga. Vi finn at ein enkel, nullsatt baselinje - som ignorerer alle relasjonsspesifikke informasjon - gjer overraska sterk utvikling. Eksperimentar på forsiktig oppretta syntetiske datasett viser også at berre nokre eksemplar av eit relasjon grunnleggjande grenser modeller frå å bruk av fyrke strukturinformasjon og kan berre bruka posisjonelle informasjon om einingar. Finningane våre utfordrer sammen dei implisitte assumpsjonane og induktive forvirkningar av førre arbeid og markerer nye retningar for forskning i dette området.', 'pl': 'Wykresy wiedzy w świecie rzeczywistym charakteryzują się często relacjami o niskiej częstotliwości – wyzwaniem, które wzbudziło rosnące zainteresowanie metodami przewidywania łączy kilku strzałów. Metody te wykonują predykcję linków dla zestawu nowych relacji, niewidocznych podczas treningu, podając tylko kilka przykładowych faktów każdej relacji w czasie testu. W niniejszej pracy przeprowadzamy systematyczne badanie nad spektrum modeli uzyskanych poprzez uogólnienie aktualnego stanu wiedzy w zakresie prognozowania połączeń mało-strzałowych, w celu zbadania granic uczenia się w tym otoczeniu kilku strzałów. Odkrywamy, że prosta, zerowa wskaźnik bazowy, który ignoruje wszelkie informacje specyficzne dla relacji, osiąga zaskakująco silne wyniki. Ponadto eksperymenty na starannie opracowanych syntetycznych zbiorach danych pokazują, że posiadanie zaledwie kilku przykładów relacji zasadniczo ogranicza modele od wykorzystania drobnoziarnistej informacji strukturalnej i pozwala tylko na wykorzystanie gruboziarnistej informacji pozycyjnej jednostek. Wspólnie nasze ustalenia kwestionują domniemane założenia i uprzedzenia indukcyjne poprzednich prac oraz podkreślają nowe kierunki badań w tej dziedzinie.', 'ro': 'Graficele cunoștințelor din lumea reală sunt adesea caracterizate de relații de joasă frecvență - o provocare care a determinat un interes crescând pentru metodele de predicție a legăturilor cu câteva lovituri. Aceste metode efectuează predicția legăturilor pentru un set de relații noi, nevăzute în timpul antrenamentului, dat doar câteva exemple de fapte ale fiecărei relații la momentul testului. În această lucrare, efectuăm un studiu sistematic asupra unui spectru de modele derivate prin generalizarea stadiului actual al tehnologiei pentru predicția legăturilor cu câteva lovituri, cu scopul de a sonda limitele învățării în acest cadru cu câteva lovituri. Considerăm că o bază simplă, zero-shot - care ignoră orice informație specifică relației - obține performanțe surprinzător de puternice. Mai mult decât atât, experimentele pe seturi de date sintetice atent create arată că având doar câteva exemple de relație limitează fundamental modelele de la utilizarea informațiilor structurale fine și permite doar exploatarea informațiilor poziționale grosiere ale entităților. Împreună, constatările noastre contestă ipotezele implicite și prejudecățile inductive ale lucrărilor anterioare și evidențiază noi direcții de cercetare în acest domeniu.', 'si': 'ඇත්තම ලෝකයේ දන්නවන් ග්\u200dරාෆික්ස් සංවිධානය අඩුවෙන් සංවිධානය සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන අභ්\u200dයාසයෙන මේ විදියට අළුත් සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ මේ වැඩේ අපි පද්ධතිය පරීක්ෂණයක් කරන්නේ මොඩල් ස්පෙක්ටර් එකේ සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට පිළිගත්තා විදියට විදියට ඉන්න විදියට විදියට විදියට විදි අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂයෙන්, ශුන්වර්ධ වෙඩි ප්\u200dරමාණයක් - ඒකෙන් සංවේදනය විශේෂ තොරතුරු අව ඉතින්, පරීක්ෂණාවක් සංවේදනය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි සම්බන්ධතාවක් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙන්නේ නිර්මාණය සම්බන්ධතාවක් විතරයි  එක්කෙන්, අපේ හොයාගන්න අභ්\u200dයාගයක් කරනවා මේ ප්\u200dරදේශයේ පරීක්ෂණය සහ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා අලුත් ප්\u200dරදේශයක් තියෙනවා.', 'so': 'Shaqooyinka aqoonta ee dunida waxaa inta badan lagu yaqaan xiriirka hoose-dhibaato ah, taas oo sababtay inay kordhiso qiimo kordhisan qaababka la sii sheegay xiriirka. Wadamadaas waxay sameeyaan wax la sii sheego xiriir cusub, mid aan la arkayn xilliga waxbarashada, tusaale ahaan wax yar oo isku xiriir ah marka lagu imtixaamo. Markaas waxan, waxaynu sameynaa waxbarasho nidaamka ah oo sameynaya tusaalooyin ka mid ah, si aan u sameyno xaaladda farshaxanka oo uu u sameeyo wax la sii sheego bandhig yar, waxaana la isku dayaa xadhigga waxbarashada oo lagu barto sawirkan yar. We find that a simple, zero-shot baseline - which ignores any relation-specific information - achieves surprisingly strong performance.  Sidoo kale imtixaanka ku saabsan macluumaadka kooxaha la xiriiray waxay muuqataa in ay haystaan tusaalooyin yar oo ka mid ah tusaalooyin asalka isku xiriirka oo aan isticmaalno macluumaadka aasaasiga ah oo la xiriiro oo la isticmaalo macluumaadka dhismaha saxda ah oo keliya ayaa isticmaali kara macluumaadka suurtagalka ee dhamaadka kooxeedka. Si wada jir ah, xaaladeena waxaa dhibaataysan malaha iyo waxyaabaha la xiriira shaqada hore iyo hagitaanka cusub ee waxbarashada marka lagu jiro.', 'sv': 'Verkliga kunskapsgrafer kännetecknas ofta av lågfrekventa relationer – en utmaning som har gett upphov till ett ökande intresse för få-skott länk prediktionsmetoder. Dessa metoder utför länkprognoser för en uppsättning nya relationer, osynliga under träning, med endast några få exempel på varje relation vid testtid. I detta arbete genomför vi en systematisk studie av ett spektrum av modeller som härrör från att generalisera det aktuella tillståndet för få-skott link prediction, med målet att sondera gränserna för lärande i denna få-skott inställning. Vi finner att en enkel, noll-shot baslinje - som ignorerar all relationsspecifik information - uppnår förvånansvärt stark prestanda. Dessutom visar experiment på noggrant utformade syntetiska datauppsättningar att endast ett fåtal exempel på en relation i grunden begränsar modeller från att använda finkornig strukturell information och endast möjliggör utnyttjande av grovkornig positionsinformation hos entiteter. Tillsammans utmanar våra resultat de implicita antagandena och induktiva fördomarna av tidigare arbete och belyser nya riktningar för forskning inom detta område.', 'ka': 'რეალური მსოფლიოს ცნობიერების გრაფიკები ზოგიერთად განსაზღვრებულია, რომელიც გამოიყენება უფრო დიდი ინტერესტი მცირე სტრუქტურების წინასწორება. ამ პროცემების შესახებ ახალი პროცემების კონფიგურაციისთვის გადაწყვეტილება, რომელიც განაკეთებულია განაკეთებულ დროში, მაგრამ ერთი მაგალითი ფაქტი ყოველ ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ სისტემატიკური მოდელების სპექტრემის სპექტრემის სპექტრემი, რომელიც წარმოდგენა მხოლოდ სურათის სტატის სტატის სტატის სტატისტატისტატისტატი ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ საუკეთესო, ნულ სტატის ფესტური ხაზი - რომელიც იგნორიცის ყველა კონფიკური ინფორმაცია - გადავიწყება საშინელად ძალ დამატებით, ექსპერიმენტები მხოლოდ შექმნილი სინტეტიკური მონაცემების მხოლოდ რამდენიმე მაგალითი შესახებ ფუნდამეტურად განზომილება მოდელების გამოყენება სტრუქტურული ინფორმაციის გამოყენება და მხოლოდ ერთად, ჩვენი შესაძლებლობები გამოცდილობენ იმპლიციტიური წარმოდგენები და ინდისტური წარმოდგენები სამუშაო სამუშაო და აღწერებენ ახალი ნაწილებები შესაძლებლო', 'ta': 'Real-world knowledge graphs are often characterized by low-frequency relations-a challenge that has prompted an increasing interest in few-shot link prediction methods.  இந்த முறைமைகள் பயிற்சியில் புதிய தொடர்புகளுக்கான இணைப்பு முன்னோட்டம் செய்யும், பயிற்சியில் மறைக்கப்படாது, ஒவ்வ இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு அமைப்பு படிப்பை செய்து கொண்டிருக்கிறோம் மாதிரிகளின் தற்போதைய நிலையை உருவாக்குவதற்காக, சில ஷாட் இணைப்பு முன்னோட்டத்திற ஒரு சுலபமான, பூஜ்ஜியமான சுட்டு அடிப்பகுதி மேலும், கவனமாக கையடக்கப்பட்ட கூடிய கூட்டிணைப்பு தகவல் அமைப்புகளின் பரிசோதனைகள் காட்டுகிறது சில உதாரணங்கள் இருக்கும் ஒரு தொடர்பு அடிப்படையான வரம்பு மாதிரி ஒன்றாக, எங்கள் கண்டுபிடிப்புகள் சவால் செய்யும் பொருளான கருத்துக்கள் மற்றும் முன்னால் வேலையின் செயல்பாடுகளை செயல்', 'ur': 'حقیقی دنیا کے علم گراف اغلب کم فرکانسی رابطہ سے تعریف کیے جاتے ہیں، ایک چال جس نے کم شٹ کے لینک کی پیش بینی طریقوں میں اضافہ کی علاقہ پیدا کی ہے. یہ طریقے نئی رابطہ کے لئے لینک کی پیش بینی کرتی ہیں، تعلیم کے وقت غیب ہوتی ہیں، صرف ہر رابطہ کے چند مثال کے ذریعے تست کے وقت حاصل کئے جاتے ہیں. اس کام میں ہم ایک سیستمائی تحقیق کریں گے جو ایک موڈل کے متعلق آزمائش کرتی ہے جو کچھ شٹ لینک کی پیش بینی کے لئے آزمائش کے ذریعہ آزمائش کے ذریعہ سے آزمائش کی محدودیت کی تحقیق کرتی ہے۔ ہمیں معلوم ہے کہ ایک ساده، صفر-شٹ بنیس لین - جو کسی رابطہ کے معلومات کو غفلت کرتا ہے - عجیب طرح مضبوط عمل حاصل کرتا ہے. اور اس کے علاوہ، سینٹیسی ڈیٹسٹ کے مطابق دکھائے ہوئے آزمائش کی آزمائش دکھاتی ہے کہ ایک تعلق کی چند مثالیں صرف بہترین دانے کی ساختار معلومات کے مطابق محدود ہوتی ہیں اور صرف انٹیٹیوں کی کورس دانے کی موقعیت معلومات کے مطابق استعمال کرنے کے اس کے ساتھ، ہمارے پیدا ہونے کے لئے پہلے کاروں کے معاملہ اور پیدا کرنے کے قابل فرضیاں اور نئی طریقوں کو اس منطقه میں تحقیق کے لئے ہیلاک کریں.', 'sr': 'Grafovi znanja na stvarnom svijetu često karakteriziraju niske frekvencije-izazov koji je izazvao veći interes za metode predviđanja veza sa malo pucnjave. Ove metode izvršavaju predviđanje veza za skup novih odnosa, nevidljivih tokom treninga, s obzirom na samo nekoliko primjernih činjenica svakog odnosa na vrijeme test a. U ovom poslu obavljamo sistematsku studiju o spektru modela iz generalizacije trenutnog stanja umetnosti za predviđanje nekoliko pogođenih veza, sa ciljem provjere granica učenja u ovom postavljanju nekoliko pogođenja. Nalazimo da jednostavna početna linija od nule pucnjave - koja ignorira svaku specifičnu informaciju o odnosima - postiže iznenađujuće jaku izvršnost. Osim toga, eksperimenti na pažljivo napravljenim sintetičkim setima podataka pokazuju da imati samo nekoliko primjera odnosa fundamentalno ograničavaju modele od korištenja strukturnih informacija, a samo omogućavaju iskoristiti pozicionalne informacije o entitetima. Zajedno, naši nalazi izazivaju implicitne pretpostavke i induktivne predrasude prethodnog rada i naglašavaju nove upute za istraživanje u ovoj oblasti.', 'vi': 'Biểu đồ kiến thức thế giới thực thường được mô tả bởi các mối quan hệ tần số thấp-một thử thách gây ra sự chú ý với các phương pháp dự đoán liên kết nhỏ. Những phương pháp này thực hiện dự đoán liên kết cho một loạt các mối quan hệ mới, không ai thấy trong thời gian huấn luyện, chỉ với một vài ví dụ về mỗi mối quan hệ trong thời gian thử nghiệm. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi làm một nghiên cứu có hệ thống về một loạt các mô hình bắt nguồn bằng cách tổng hợp trạng thái hiện thời cho dự đoán các mối liên kết nhỏ với mục đích tìm hiểu giới hạn học tại các trường hợp hiếm hoi này. Chúng tôi thấy rằng một cơ sở cơ bản tầm bắn không đơn giản- không bỏ qua bất kỳ thông tin tương quan- đạt hiệu suất mạnh ngạc nhiên. Hơn nữa, thí nghiệm trên các bộ dữ liệu tổng hợp được tạo cẩn thận cho thấy chỉ có vài ví dụ về mối quan hệ về cơ bản hạn chế các mô- đun sử dụng thông tin cấu trúc đặc biệt và chỉ cho phép khai thác các thông tin vị rộng của thực thể. Kết quả của chúng ta thách thức các giả định tiềm ẩn và các giả thuyết dẫn nhiệt của việc nghiên cứu trước và hướng dẫn mới trong lĩnh vực này.', 'uz': "Name These methods perform link prediction for a set of new relations, unseen during training, given only a few example facts of each relation at test time.  Bu ishda, biz bir tizim o'rganishni bir necha shaklga bogʻ'lamaning holatini yaratish mumkin modellarning koʻrinishida o'rganish chegarasini bajaramiz. Biz o'ylaymiz, oddiy, nuqta-nuqta asboblarning asboblarini o'zgartirib turadi. Bu aloqalar hodisa maʼlumot yolg'on emas - juda ajoyib ishlaydi. Ko'pchilik qo'llangan tizimlar tarkibida taʼminlov qilinadigan taʼminlovlar bilan faqat bir necha misol bilan bog'liqning asosiy tuzilishi modellaridan foydalanishi mumkin va faqat qo'llangan tizimlarning joylashtirilgan maʼlumotini foydalanishiga ruxsat beradi. Bizning murakkablarimiz bir necha ishni boshqaruvchi tashkilotlar va eng harakat ishlarni qiziqarish va bu yerda o'rganish uchun yangi yo'nalarni ko'rsatadi.", 'bg': 'Графите на знанието в реалния свят често се характеризират с нискочестотни отношения - предизвикателство, което предизвиква нарастващ интерес към методите за прогнозиране на няколко кадъра връзки. Тези методи извършват прогнозиране на връзките за набор от нови отношения, невидими по време на тренировка, като се дават само няколко примерни факти за всяка връзка по време на теста. В тази работа ние извършваме систематично проучване на спектър от модели, получени чрез обобщаване на текущото състояние на изкуството за прогнозиране на няколко кадъра връзки, с цел сондиране на границите на ученето в тази настройка на няколко кадъра. Намираме, че проста, нулева базова линия - която игнорира всяка специфична информация за връзката - постига изненадващо силна производителност. Освен това, експерименти с внимателно изработени синтетични набори от данни показват, че наличието на само няколко примера за връзка фундаментално ограничава моделите от използването на фина структурна информация и позволява само експлоатирането на грубозърнестата позиционна информация на единиците. Заедно нашите констатации оспорват имплицитните предположения и индуктивните пристрастия на предишната работа и подчертават нови направления за изследвания в тази област.', 'da': 'Virkelighedens vidensgrafer er ofte karakteriseret ved lavfrekvente relationer – en udfordring, der har givet anledning til en stigende interesse for få-skud link forudsigelsesmetoder. Disse metoder udfører linkforudsigelse for et sæt nye relationer, som ikke ses under træning, givet kun et par eksempler på hver relation på testtidspunktet. I dette arbejde udfører vi en systematisk undersøgelse af et spektrum af modeller udledt ved at generalisere den nuværende state of te art for få-skud link forudsigelse, med det formål at undersøge grænserne for læring i denne få-skud indstilling. Vi finder ud af, at en simpel, zero-shot baseline - som ignorerer eventuelle relationsspecifikke oplysninger - opnår overraskende stærk ydeevne. Desuden viser eksperimenter med omhyggeligt udformede syntetiske datasæt, at kun få eksempler på en relation grundlæggende begrænser modeller fra at bruge finkornede strukturelle oplysninger og kun giver mulighed for at udnytte de grovkornede positionsoplysninger om enheder. Sammen udfordrer vores resultater de implicitte antagelser og induktive fordomme ved tidligere arbejde og fremhæver nye retninger for forskning på dette område.', 'hr': 'Grafovi znanja na stvarnom svijetu često karakteriziraju niske frekvencije-izazov koji je izazvao povećanje interesa za metode predviđanja veza s malo pucnjave. Ove metode izvršavaju predviđanje povezanja za skup novih odnosa, nevidljivih tijekom obuke, s obzirom na samo nekoliko primjernih činjenica svakog odnosa u vrijeme ispitivanja. U ovom poslu obavljamo sistematsko ispitivanje o spektru modela iz generalizacije trenutnog stanja umjetnosti za predviđanje nekoliko pogođenih veza, s ciljem provjere ograničenja učenja u ovom malom snimku. Nalazimo da jednostavna početna linija nule pucnjave - koja ignorira bilo kakve informacije o specifičnim odnosima - postiže iznenađujuće jake učinke. Osim toga, eksperimenti na pažljivo napravljenim sintetičkim podacima pokazuju da imati samo nekoliko primjera odnosa osnovno ograničava modele od korištenja strukturnih informacija sa zgromnom zrnom i samo omogućava iskoristiti pozicionalne informacije o entitetima. Zajedno, naši nalazi izazivaju implicitne pretpostavke i induktivne predrasude prethodnog rada i naglašavaju nove upute za istraživanje u ovom području.', 'nl': 'Werkelijke kennisgrafieken worden vaak gekenmerkt door laagfrequente relaties – een uitdaging die een toenemende interesse heeft gewekt in few-shot link prediction methodes. Deze methoden voeren koppelvoorspelling uit voor een reeks nieuwe relaties, ongezien tijdens de training, gegeven slechts een paar voorbeeldfeiten van elke relatie op het testmoment. In dit werk voeren we een systematische studie uit naar een spectrum van modellen afgeleid door de huidige stand van de techniek voor few-shot link voorspelling te generaliseren, met als doel de grenzen van leren in deze few-shot setting te onderzoeken. We vinden dat een eenvoudige nul-shot baseline waarde die elke relatie-specifieke informatie negeert, verrassend sterke prestaties oplevert. Bovendien tonen experimenten met zorgvuldig vervaardigde synthetische datasets aan dat het hebben van slechts enkele voorbeelden van een relatie modellen fundamenteel beperkt van het gebruik van fijnkorrelige structurele informatie en alleen toelaat om de grove positieinformatie van entiteiten te exploiteren. Samen stellen onze bevindingen de impliciete veronderstellingen en inductieve vooroordelen van eerder werk in vraag en benadrukken ze nieuwe richtingen voor onderzoek op dit gebied.', 'fa': 'گرافیک دانش واقعی دنیا اغلب توسط رابطه های فرکانس کم و کم و کم و کم و کم و کم و کم و کم و کم و کم و کم و کم و کم و کم و کم و کم و کم و کم و کم و کم و کم و کم و کم و این روش\u200cها پیش\u200cبینی ارتباط برای مجموعه\u200cی ارتباط جدید را انجام می\u200cدهند، در زمان آموزش غیب\u200cآشکار، فقط چند حقیقت مثالی از هر ارتباط در زمان آزمایش داده می\u200cشود. در این کار، ما یک مطالعه سیستماتیک روی یک spektrum از مدل\u200cهایی انجام می\u200cدهیم که با توجه به موقعیت فعلی هنر برای پیش\u200cبینی از لینک\u200cهای چند شلیک، با هدف تحقیق محدودیت یادگیری در این تنظیمات چند شلیک است. ما فهمیدیم که یک خط اصلی ساده، صفر شلیک - که هیچ اطلاعات خاص ارتباطی را نادیده بگیرد - به عملکرد فوق العاده قوی رسیده است. علاوه بر این، آزمایشات روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای بسیار دقت ساخته شده نشان می\u200cدهند که تنها چند مثال از یک ارتباط اساسا مدل\u200cها را از استفاده از اطلاعات ساختاری ساختاری پاکیزه محدود می\u200cکند و تنها برای استفاده از اطلاعات موقعیت\u200cهای موقعیت\u200cهای ساختاری که با همدیگر، نتیجه\u200cهای ما فرضیه\u200cهای غیر قابل تحقیقات و پیشرفت\u200cهای پیشینیان را چالش می\u200cدهند و مسیرهای جدید برای تحقیقات در این منطقه را تسبیح می\u200cدهند.', 'de': 'Reale Wissensgraphen zeichnen sich oft durch niederfrequente Beziehungen aus – eine Herausforderung, die ein zunehmendes Interesse an Methoden zur Vorhersage von wenigen Verbindungen ausgelöst hat. Diese Methoden führen eine Verknüpfungsprädiktion für eine Reihe neuer Beziehungen durch, die während des Trainings nicht sichtbar sind, anhand von nur wenigen Beispieldaten jeder Beziehung zum Testzeitpunkt. In dieser Arbeit führen wir eine systematische Studie über ein Spektrum von Modellen durch, die aus der Verallgemeinerung des aktuellen Standes der Technik für die Vorhersage von Few-Shot-Verbindungen abgeleitet werden, mit dem Ziel, die Grenzen des Lernens in diesem Few-Shot-Setting zu erforschen. Wir finden, dass eine einfache Null-Schuss-Baseline-Zahl, die alle relationsspezifischen Informationen ignoriert, überraschend starke Leistung erzielt. Darüber hinaus zeigen Experimente an sorgfältig gestalteten synthetischen Datensätzen, dass nur wenige Beispiele für eine Beziehung Modelle von der Verwendung feinkörniger Strukturinformationen grundsätzlich einschränken und nur die grobkörnigen Positionsinformationen von Entitäten ausnutzen können. Gemeinsam hinterfragen unsere Ergebnisse implizite Annahmen und induktive Verzerrungen früherer Arbeiten und zeigen neue Forschungsrichtungen auf.', 'sw': 'Takwimu za maarifa halisi za dunia mara nyingi huwekwa tayari na mahusiano ya kiwango cha chini cha umeme-changamoto ambayo imesababisha kuongezeka kwa maslahi ya kutabiri njia chache za kiungo hicho. Hatua hizi zinafanya utabiri wa uhusiano mpya, usiofahamika wakati wa mafunzo, kwa mfano wachache tu wa kila mahusiano wakati wa jaribio. In this work, we perform a systematic study on a spectrum of models derived by generalizing the current state of the art for few-shot link prediction, with the goal of probing the limits of learning in this few-shot setting.  Tunapata kwamba msingi wa risasi rahisi na sifuri - ambao unapuuza taarifa zote zinazohusiana na mahusiano - unapata ufanisi mkubwa wa kushangaza. Zaidi ya hayo, majaribio kuhusu seti za taarifa zilizopangwa kwa makini yanaonyesha kuwa na mifano michache tu ya mifano ya mahusiano ya msingi kutoka kwa kutumia taarifa nzuri za ujenzi na tu inaruhusu kutumia taarifa chanya za vituo vyenye mafunzo. Kwa pamoja, matokeo yetu yanachanganya dhana na upendeleo usio na maana wa kazi za kabla na kuonyesha njia mpya za utafiti katika eneo hili.', 'ko': '현실 세계의 지식도는 보통 저주파 관계를 특징으로 하는데 이 도전은 사람들이 소렌즈 링크 예측 방법에 대해 점점 흥미를 가지게 한다.이러한 방법은 한 그룹의 새로운 관계에 대해 링크 예측을 실행하는데 이러한 새로운 관계는 훈련 기간에 보이지 않고 테스트할 때 각 관계의 몇 가지 예시적인 사실만 제시한다.이 작업에서 우리는 일련의 모델에 대해 체계적인 연구를 진행했다. 이런 모델은 현재 소수 렌즈 링크 예측의 최신 기술을 요약함으로써 얻어진 것으로 이런 소수 렌즈 환경에서 학습하는 한계성을 탐색하는 데 목적을 둔다.우리는 관계에 특정한 정보를 무시하는 간단한 제로 포석 기선이 놀라운 성능을 얻을 수 있다는 것을 발견했다.또한 정성들여 제작된 합성 데이터 집합에서의 실험에 의하면 소수의 관계 예시만 모델의 세립도 구조 정보 사용을 근본적으로 제한하고 실체의 굵은 입도 위치 정보만 이용할 수 있음을 알 수 있다.한 마디로 하면 우리의 발견은 이전에 작업한 은밀한 가설과 귀납적 편견에 도전했고 이 분야 연구의 새로운 방향을 강조했다.', 'id': 'Real-world knowledge graphs are often characterized by low-frequency relations-a challenge that has prompted an increasing interest in few-shot link prediction methods.  Metode ini melakukan prediksi hubungan untuk set hubungan baru, tidak terlihat selama latihan, diberikan hanya beberapa contoh fakta setiap hubungan pada waktu tes. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami melakukan sebuah studi sistematis pada spektrum model yang didirikan dengan menggeneralisasikan keadaan seni saat ini untuk prediksi hubungan beberapa tembakan, dengan tujuan untuk menguji batas belajar dalam setting beberapa tembakan ini. Kami menemukan bahwa dasar yang sederhana, zero-shot - yang mengabaikan informasi spesifik hubungan - mencapai prestasi yang mengejutkan kuat. Selain itu, eksperimen pada set data sintetik yang dibuat dengan hati-hati menunjukkan bahwa memiliki hanya beberapa contoh hubungan secara dasar membatasi model dari menggunakan informasi struktural yang mirip dan hanya memungkinkan untuk mengeksploitasi informasi posisional yang mirip-mirip dari entitas. Together, our findings challenge the implicit assumptions and inductive biases of prior work and highlight new directions for research in this area.', 'sq': 'Grafiket e njohurive të botës reale shpesh karakterizohen nga marrëdhëniet me frekuencë të ulët-një sfidë që ka nxitur një interes në rritje në metodat e parashikimit të lidhjeve me disa fotografi. Këto metoda kryejnë parashikime lidhjesh për një sërë marrëdhënieve të reja, të padukshme gjatë trajnimit, duke dhënë vetëm disa shembuj faktesh të çdo marrëdhënie në kohën e testit. Në këtë punë, ne kryejmë një studim sistematik mbi një spektrum modelesh të nxjerrë nga gjeneralizimi i gjeneralizimit të gjendjes aktuale të artit për parashikimin e lidhjeve me pak fotografi, me qëllim të analizojmë kufijtë e mësimit në këtë ambient me pak fotografi. Ne gjejmë se një bazë e thjeshtë, zero-shot - e cila injoron çdo informacion të veçantë lidhje - arrin performancë surprizuese të fortë. Përveç kësaj, eksperimentet në grupe të dhënash sintetike të ndërtuara me kujdes tregojnë se vetëm disa shembuj të një marrëdhënie kufizojnë në thelb modelet nga përdorimi i informacionit strukturor të hollë dhe lejojnë vetëm shfrytëzimin e informacionit pozitiv të hollë të njësive. Së bashku, gjetjet tona sfidojnë supozimet implicite dhe paragjykimet induktive të punës së mëparshme dhe theksojnë drejtimet e reja për kërkimin në këtë fushë.', 'am': 'የእውነት-ዓለም እውቀት ግንኙነት በብዛት በዝግታ ግንኙነት እና በጥቂት የተነሳ የግንኙነት ለመቀናቀል ማቀናጃ ማድረግ ያሳየዋል፡፡ እነዚህ ሥርዓቶች የአዲስ ግንኙነትን ለመፍጠር የሚቆጠሩ አዲስ ግንኙነት፣ በተማሪዎች ጊዜ ያልታወቁ፣ የሁሉንም ግንኙነት በሞከሩ ጊዜ ጥቂት ምሳሌ ብቻ ሲሰጡ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የአሁኑን የዐርብ ሁኔታ ለጥቂት ወታደሮች ለመፍጠር የሚደረገውን የሥርዓት ትምህርት እናደርጋለን፡፡ We find that a simple, zero-shot baseline - which ignores any relation-specific information - achieves surprisingly strong performance.  Moreover, experiments on carefully crafted synthetic datasets show that having only a few examples of a relation fundamentally limits models from using fine-grained structural information and only allows for exploiting the coarse-grained positional information of entities.  በአንድነት፣ ፍላጎታችን የፊተኛውን ሥራ እና የስራ ግንኙነታችንን አቃውሎ እና በዚህች ቦታ ውስጥ ለመምርምር አዲስ መንገድ የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Իրական աշխարհի գիտելիքների գրաֆիկները հաճախ բնորոշվում են ցածր հաճախականության հարաբերություններով՝ մարտահրավերով, որը առաջացրեց աճող հետաքրքրություն մի քանի տեսակի կապերի կանխատեսման մեթոդներով: Այս մեթոդները կատարում են նոր հարաբերությունների կապերի կանխատեսումը, որոնք չեն տեսնում ուսուցման ընթացքում, հաշվի առնելով միայն մի քանի օրինակ թեստերի ժամանակ յուրաքանչյուր հարաբերության փաստեր: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք կատարում ենք մի սիստեմատիկ ուսումնասիրություն մոդելների սպեկտրի վրա, որը ստեղծվում է ընդհանուր արվեստի ներկայիս կարգավիճակի ընդլայնելով մի քանի նկարների կապերի կանխատեսման համար, որպեսզի ուսուցման սահմանները փորձենք այս մի քանի նկա Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ պարզ, զրոյական սկզբունքները, որոնք անտեսում են ցանկացած հարաբերությունների կոնկրետ տեղեկատվություն, զարմանալիորեն ուժեղ արդյունք են ստանում: Ավելին, ուշադիր ձևավորված սինթետիկ տվյալների համակարգերի փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ հարաբերության մի քանի օրինակ հիմնականում սահմանափակում է մոդելները՝ օգտագործելով նրբագեղ կառուցվածքային տեղեկատվություն և միայն թույլ է տալիս օգտագործել միա Together, our findings challenge the implicit assumptions and inductive biases of prior work and highlight new directions for research in this area.', 'bn': 'বাস্তব-বিশ্বের জ্ঞানের গ্রাফ প্রায়শই নীচের সম্পর্ক-একটি চ্যালেঞ্জের মাধ্যমে চিহ্নিত করা হয়েছে যা কিছু গুলি লিংকের ভবিষ্যতে এই পদ্ধতিগুলো প্রশিক্ষণের সময় নতুন সম্পর্কের জন্য নতুন সম্পর্কের ভবিষ্যৎবাণী করে, অদৃশ্য, প্রত্যেক সম্পর্কের কিছু উদাহরণের ক এই কাজে আমরা একটি সিস্টেমিক গবেষণা শুরু করি যা মডেলের বর্তমান অবস্থা জেনারেল করেছি কিছুটা গুলি লিংকের ভবিষ্যতের জন্য, যার লক্ষ্যে এই সংখ্যাগুলোর শিক্ষার স আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে একটি সাধারণ, শূন্য-গুলি বেস্লাইন - যা কোন সম্পর্ক-নির্দিষ্ট তথ্য উপেক্ষা করে যায় - বিস্ময়কর ভ এছাড়াও, সচেতনভাবে কাজ করা সিন্টেটিক ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে কেবল একটি সম্পর্কের মৌলিক মোডেলের কয়েকটি উদাহরণ রয়েছে সুন্দর কাঠামোর তথ্ একসাথে আমাদের খুঁজে পাওয়া গেছে পূর্ববর্তী কাজের বিরুদ্ধে গবেষণা এবং প্রতিষ্ঠানের বিরুদ্ধে প্রভাবিত ধারণার চ্যালেঞ', 'az': 'Gerçek dünya elmi grafikləri çox sıxıntılı sıxıntılı ilişkilər ilə qarşılaşdırılır. Bu, çox az sıxıntılı ilişkilərin tədbir metodlarından artırmağı təsəvvür etdi. Bu metodlar təhsil vaxtında yeni ilişkiler üçün bağlantı tədbirlərini təhsil edir, hər ilişkilərin bəzi nümunələri təhsil vaxtında istifadə edir. Bu işdə, biz bir modellərin spektrumu sistematik təhsil edirik ki, bu küçük şəkildə öyrənmək müəyyən edilməsi üçün, sanatın a ğıllığı müəyyən edilməsi ilə təhsil edir. Biz sadəcə, sıfır-vuruş əsas səhifəsi - hər hansı bir əlaqə müəyyən edilməyən məlumatı - təəccüblü güclü performansı başa çatdırır. Daha sonra, dikkatli sintetik verilənlərin təcrübələrində ancaq bir neçə məsəl çəkdiyini göstərər ki, sünbülli strukturlu məlumatları istifadə etməkdən modellərin çox məsəlləri var və sadəcə istifadə etməkdə istifadə edir. Birlikte, araştırmalarımız bu bölgedə araştırma üçün yeni yönəltmələri təşkil edir.', 'af': "Real-wêreld kennis grafieke is dikwels karakteriseer deur lae-frekwensierelasies-â\x80\x99n uitdrukking wat 'n vergroeter belang gevra het in paar-skoot skakel voorskoumetodes. Hierdie metodes uitvoer skakel voorskou vir 'n stel van nuwe verwantings, ongesien tydens onderwerp, gegee slegs 'n paar voorbeeld fakte van elke verwanting op toets tyd. In hierdie werk, ons uitvoer 'n sistematiese studie op 'n spektrum van modele afgeleide deur die huidige staat van die kuns te genereer vir 'n paar skoot skakel voorskou, met die doel van probeer van die grense van leer in hierdie paar skoot opstelling. Ons vind dat 'n eenvoudige, nul-skoot basislien - wat ignoreer enige relatie-spesifieke inligting - verwonderlik sterk prestasie bereik. Ook, eksperimente op versigtig geskepte sintetiese datastelle vertoon dat net 'n paar voorbeelde van 'n verwanting basiese beperk modele van die gebruik van fyn-graad struktuurlike inligting en alleen toelaat vir die uitbreiding van die kors-graad posisieale inligting van entiteite. En saam, ons gevinde het die inplisite aanvaardighede en induktiewe voorspoedighede van vooraf werk uitgevaar en nuwe rigtings verlig vir onderspoedighede in hierdie area.", 'tr': 'Gerçek dünýäde bilgi grafikleri köplenç ýigrimi ýok derejesi bilen a ňsatlyk bilen gyzyklandyrylýar. Bu kynçylyk çekici baglaýyşyň öngörüm yöntemleri bilen gyzyklandyrýar. Bu döwletler täze baglaýyşlar üçin baglaýyşyk täze baglaýyşlar üçin baglaýyşyk edýär, okuwçylyk wagtynda diňe birnäçe mysal faktalary test wagtynda berilýär. Bu işde, biz bu küçük resim düzümlerinde öwrenmeniň sınırlaryny barlamak üçin sungatyň häzirki durumyny döwletleşdirýän bir nusgada sistematik bir arzuw edip otyrys. Biz basit, sıfır-atly temel çyzygy tapýarys - hem bir baglaýyşyň üstine ýok bolmagyny - geň güýçli hereket edip bilýäris. Munuň üçin, dykkatly döredilen syntetik datawatlaryň barlamasynda örnekler diňe birnäçe mysal bar diňe gaty diňe süýtgeli struktur maglumatyny ulanmakdan howply çykarýarlar we diňe süýtgeli gabdalyk maglumatyny ulanmakda mümkin edýär. Birlikde, tapylyklarymyz öňki iş üçin täze hili pikirleri we netijeli hereketlerimizi kynçylyklaýar we şol bölgede ylmy üçin täze yönleri ýagtylaýar.', 'ca': "Els gràfics del coneixement del món real sovint es caracteritzen per relacions de baixa freqüència-un repte que ha provocat un interès creixent en mètodes de predicció d'enllaços amb poques fotos. Aquests mètodes produeixen prediccions d'enllaços per un conjunt de noves relacions, invisibles durant l'entrenament, donant només alguns exemples de fets de cada relació al moment de la prova. En aquesta feina, fem un estudi sistemàtic d'un espectre de models derivats generalitzant l'estat actual d'art per prediccions d'enllaços poc fotografiats, amb l'objectiu de sondar els límits de l'aprenentatge en aquest entorn poc fotografiats. We find that a simple, zero-shot baseline - which ignores any relation-specific information - achieves surprisingly strong performance.  A més, experiments en conjunts de dades sintètiques elaborats amb cura mostren que tenir només alguns exemples d'una relació limita fonamentalment els models d'utilitzar informació estructural fina i només permet explotar la informació positional grossa d'entitats. Junts, els nostres descobriments desafian les suposicions implícites i les tendències inductives del treball anterior i destaquen les noves direccions per a la recerca en aquesta àrea.", 'et': 'Reaalmaailma teadmiste graafikuid iseloomustavad sageli madala sagedusega seotud suhted – väljakutse, mis on tekitanud kasvavat huvi vähese pildi lingi ennustamise meetodite vastu. Need meetodid prognoosivad seoseid uute suhete kogumi jaoks, mida treeningu ajal ei nähta, võttes arvesse vaid mõningaid näidisfakte iga seose kohta katseajal. Käesolevas töös teostame süstemaatilise uuringu mudelite spektri kohta, mis tuletatakse üldistades tehnika hetkeseisu vähese pildi lingi ennustamiseks, eesmärgiga uurida õppimise piire selles vähese pildi seadmes. Leiame, et lihtne, null-shot algväärtus - mis ignoreerib igasugust seose spetsiifilist teavet - saavutab üllatavalt tugeva jõudluse. Lisaks näitavad hoolikalt töötatud sünteetiliste andmekogumitega tehtud katsed, et ainult mõned näited seosest piiravad põhimõtteliselt mudelite kasutamist peeneteralise struktuurse teabe kasutamist ja võimaldavad kasutada ainult üksuste jämeda asukohateavet. Üheskoos vaidlustavad meie tulemused varasema töö kaudseid eeldusi ja induktiivseid kallakuid ning toovad esile uusi suundi selles valdkonnas tehtavate uuringute jaoks.', 'bs': 'Grafovi znanja na stvarnom svijetu često se karakteriziraju niskim frekvencijama-izazovom koji je izazvao veći interes za metode predviđanja veza sa malo snimka. Ove metode izvršavaju predviđanje veza za skup novih odnosa, nevidljivih tijekom treninga, s obzirom na samo nekoliko primjernih činjenica svakog odnosa na vrijeme test a. U ovom poslu, obavljamo sistematsku studiju o spektru modela iz generalizacije trenutnog stanja umjetnosti za predviđanje nekoliko snimka veza, s ciljem provjere granica učenja u ovom malom snimku. Nalazimo da jednostavna početna linija nule pucnjave - koja ignorira bilo kakve informacije o specifičnim odnosima - postiže iznenađujuće jake učinke. Osim toga, eksperimenti na pažljivo napravljenim sintetičkim podacima pokazuju da imati samo nekoliko primjera odnosa osnovno ograničava modele od korištenja strukturnih informacija, a samo omogućavaju iskoristiti pozicionalne informacije o entitetima. Zajedno, naši nalazi izazivaju implicitne pretpostavke i induktivne predrasude prethodnog rada i naglašavaju nove upute za istraživanje u ovom području.', 'cs': 'Grafy znalostí v reálném světě jsou často charakterizovány nízkofrekvenčními vztahy – výzvou, která vyvolala rostoucí zájem o metody predikce několika výstřelů. Tyto metody provádějí predikci vazeb pro sadu nových vztahů, neviditelných během tréninku, s uvedením pouze několika příkladových faktů každého vztahu v době testu. V této práci provádíme systematickou studii na spektru modelů odvozených zobecněním současného stavu techniky pro predikci několika záběrů s cílem prozkoumat hranice učení v tomto několika záběrech. Zjišťujeme, že jednoduchá nulová základní hodnota, která ignoruje veškeré informace specifické pro vztahy, dosahuje překvapivě silného výkonu. Kromě toho experimenty na pečlivě sestavených syntetických datových sadách ukazují, že pouze několik příkladů vztahu zásadně omezuje modely používat jemnozrnné strukturální informace a umožňuje využít pouze hrubozrnné polohové informace entit. Naše zjištění společně zpochybňují implicitní předpoklady a indukční předsudky předchozí práce a upozorňují na nové směry výzkumu v této oblasti.', 'fi': 'Reaalimaailman tietograafille on usein ominaista matalataajuussuhteet – haaste, joka on herättänyt kasvavan kiinnostuksen muutaman kuvan ennustusmenetelmiin. Nämä menetelmät suorittavat linkin ennustamisen uusille suhteille, joita ei ole nähty harjoittelun aikana, kun otetaan huomioon vain muutama esimerkki kustakin suhteesta testin aikana. Tässä työssä suoritamme systemaattisen tutkimuksen malleista, jotka on johdettu yleistämällä nykytekniikan nykytilaa muutaman kuvan linkin ennustamiseen, tavoitteena tutkia oppimisen rajoja tässä muutaman kuvan ympäristössä. Huomaamme, että yksinkertainen, nolla-shot perusskenaario - joka jättää huomiotta kaikki suhdekohtaiset tiedot - saavuttaa yllättävän vahvan suorituskyvyn. Lisäksi huolellisesti valmistettujen synteettisten aineistojen kokeet osoittavat, että vain muutama esimerkki suhteesta rajoittaa pohjimmiltaan malleja käyttämästä hienojakoista rakenteellista tietoa ja mahdollistaa vain entiteettien karkean sijaintitiedon hyödyntämisen. Yhdessä tutkimustuloksemme haastavat aiemman työn implisiittiset oletukset ja induktiiviset ennakkoluulot ja korostavat uusia suuntaviivoja alan tutkimukselle.', 'jv': 'graphs Awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe perusahaan kanggo nggawe perusahaan anyar, ora iso nggawe tarjamahan, nganggo perusahaan patik dhéwé, sapa perusahaan langgar sapa perusahaan kanggo ujian. Nang iki trabah, kita dadi sistematik saben aturan ing kaya model sing paling nggawe ngubah perusahaan kanggo kalagayaan kanggo nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas. Awak dhéwé ngerasah sistem sing sampeyan, 0-uwis kuwi lagi nggawe informasi sing apik perusahaan- iso dianggawe barang apik sing gak dhéwé. Label Piye ditambah, akeh mbukak dhéwé kuwi nggawe lan ijol-ijolan sing beraksi perusahaan lan biasa layanan sing beraksi kuwi tindakan kanggo nguasai perusahaan anyar iki.', 'sk': 'Za grafe znanja realnega sveta so pogosto značilni nizkofrekvenčni odnosi – izziv, ki je povzročil vse večje zanimanje za metode napovedovanja nekaj posnetkov povezav. Te metode izvajajo napoved povezav za niz novih odnosov, ki jih med treningom ni mogoče opaziti, in upoštevajo le nekaj primerov dejstev o vsakem odnosu v času preskusa. V tem delu smo izvedli sistematično študijo spektra modelov, izpeljanih s posploševanjem trenutnega stanja tehnike za napovedovanje povezav z nekaj posnetki, s ciljem prodiranja meja učenja v tem nekaj posnetkih. Ugotovili smo, da preprosta, ničelna osnovna izhodišča - ki ignorira vse informacije, specifične za relacijo - doseže presenetljivo močno zmogljivost. Poleg tega eksperimenti na skrbno oblikovanih sintetičnih naborih podatkov kažejo, da ima le nekaj primerov relacije osnovno omejitev modelov pri uporabi drobnozrnatih strukturnih informacij in omogoča le izkoriščanje grobozrnatih pozicijskih informacij entitet. Naše ugotovitve skupaj izpodbijajo implicitne predpostavke in induktivne pristranskosti predhodnega dela ter poudarjajo nove smeri raziskav na tem področju.', 'bo': 'དངོས་གནས་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་དབྱེ་རིས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་དེ་དཀྱིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ཉུང་བའི་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་གདོང་ལེན་བྱེད་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཉུང ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་དག་ལ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་གསར་པ་ཞིག་གི་སྔོན་ལྟར་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་མིག་སྔར་སྒྲིག་གི་མཐུད་ཚད་ཉུང་བའི་རྣམ་པ་ལ་ལས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོས་མཐོང་ནི་སླ་བོ་ཞིག་མིན་པར་གཞི་རྩིས་བ་ཞིག་གིས་མེ། Moreover, experiments on carefully crafted synthetic datasets show that having only a few examples of a relation fundamentally limits models from using fine-grain structural information and only allows for exploiting the coarse-grain positional information of entities. མཉམ་དུ་ང་ཚོའི་མཐོང་སྣང་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་འཚོལ་བ་སྐྱེས་པའི་བསམ་ཚུལ་དང་ལས་སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་འཚོལ་བཞིན་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་གསར་བ་ཞིག', 'ha': "Fassarar kunnuwa na cikin duniya da yawa an a ƙayyade su da kuma ma'anar-mutane-wata tsohon da ya yi ƙara da amfani da shiryoyin shaidun da suka ƙayyade. Wannan shiryoyin su ƙayyade birnin linki wa wani haɗi na daban, da ba'a ɓõye ba a lokacin mafarin, da kawai kaɗan misãlai masu cikin each link a lokacin jarrabãwa. Daga wannan aikin, munã tafiyar wani littãfi na'ura a kan wani misalin da aka samar da shi na sami halin kunyar da ke kai yanzu zuwa wani abu da aka yi wa hisãbi da sauri-sauti, da goan ya sami tsarin karanta cikin wannan tsarin da aka kamata. Tuna gane cewa wani salon mai sauri da sifilo - wanda ke ƙẽtare wani lãbãri na masu husũma - ya sami fani mai ƙarfi. Ko kuma, jarrabãwa na danne-danne masu taƙaita da inganci da kuma ana nuna cewa ana da misãlai kaɗan kawai daga misãlai masu husũma masu bincike daga yin amfani da information na tsarin tsari masu tsari da aka samu da kuma yana yarda kawai da yin amfani da bayani-grafen takaicin maɓalli. Together, our findings challenge the implicit assumptions and inductive biases of prior work and highlight new directions for research in this area.", 'he': 'Real-world knowledge graphs are often characterized by low-frequency relations-a challenge that has prompted an increasing interest in few-shot link prediction methods.  השיטות האלה מבצעות חיזוי קשרים עבור קבוצת מערכות יחסים חדשות, בלתי נראות במהלך האימון, בהתחשב רק במספר דוגמאות עובדות של כל מערכת יחסים בזמן המבחן. בעבודה הזו, אנו מבצעים מחקר שיטתי על ספקטרום של דוגמנים שנוצאים על ידי הגנרליזציה של מצב האמנות הנוכחי לחזוי חיבורים מעטים, עם המטרה לחקור את הגבולות של הלימוד במסגרת הזאת של צילומים מעטים. אנו מוצאים שבסיפון פשוט, אפס-ירייה, שמתעלם מכל מידע מסוים למערכת יחסים, משיג ביצועים חזקים באופן מפתיע. חוץ מזה, ניסויים על קבוצות נתונים סינטטיים שעשויות בזהירות מראים שיש רק כמה דוגמאות של יחסים גובלות בסיסית דוגמאות משימוש במידע מבניין מעורפל ורק מאפשר לנצל את המידע המקומי של היחידות בעורפל. Together, our findings challenge the implicit assumptions and inductive biases of prior work and highlight new directions for research in this area.'}
{'en': 'ProFormer : Towards On-Device LSH Projection Based Transformers', 'es': 'ProFormer: Hacia transformadores basados en proyección LSH en el dispositivo', 'fr': 'ProFormer\xa0: Vers des transformateurs basés sur des projections LSH sur appareil', 'pt': 'ProFormer: rumo a transformadores baseados em projeção LSH no dispositivo', 'ar': 'ProFormer: نحو محولات قائمة على الإسقاط LSH على الجهاز', 'ja': 'ProFormer ：デバイス上のLSH投影ベースの変圧器に向けて', 'zh': '鍓嶈韩:杩堝悜鍩轰簬LSH鎶曞奖涔嬪彉鍘嬪櫒', 'hi': 'ProFormer: ऑन-डिवाइस LSH प्रोजेक्शन आधारित ट्रांसफॉर्मर की ओर', 'ru': 'ProFormer: К встроенным в устройство LSH-проекционным трансформаторам', 'ga': 'ProFormer: I dTreo Claochladáin Bunaithe ar Theilgean LSH Ar-Gléas', 'ka': 'პროფორმენტი: მოწყობილობის LSH პროექტის ბაზეული ტრანფორმენტირები', 'el': 'Προς τους μετασχηματιστές με βάση την προβολή στη συσκευή', 'hu': 'ProFormer: Az LSH projektion alapú transzformátorok felé', 'kk': 'Бұрынғы: Құрылғыдағы LSH проектінің негіздеген түрлендірушілеріне қарсы', 'lt': 'ProFormer: prie įrenginio LSH projektavimo pagrindu grindžiamų transformatorių', 'it': 'ProFormer: Verso trasformatori basati sulla proiezione LSH sul dispositivo', 'mk': 'ProFormer: кон претворители базирани на проектирање на LSH на вклучен уред', 'mt': 'ProFormer: Lejn Trasformaturi Ibbażati fuq Proġettazzjoni LSH fuq Tagħmir', 'ms': 'ProFormer: Towards On-Device LSH Projection Based Transformers', 'mn': 'Өмнөх: Хэрэглэгч LSH төслийн төслийн түвшинд', 'ml': 'പദ്ധതി: ഉപകരണത്തിന്റെ മുകളിലേക്ക് മുകളിലേക്കു് LSH പദ്ധതി', 'ro': 'ProFormer: Către transformatoare bazate pe proiecție LSH pe dispozitiv', 'sr': 'Predstavnik: prema projektiranju LSH na uređaju temeljenim transformatorima', 'no': 'Førre: Gå til LSH- prosjekt basert på einingar', 'pl': 'ProFormer: W kierunku urządzeniowych transformatorów opartych na projekcji LSH', 'sv': 'ProFormer: Mot LSH-projektionsbaserade transformatorer på enheten', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරොස්ටර්: උපකරණය LSH ව්\u200dයාපෘතිය අධාරිත ප්\u200dරවර්තනය', 'ur': 'پراپراگر: اون- دستگاه LSH پروژیکشن بنیاد تغییرات کی طرف', 'so': 'ProFormer: Towards On-Device LSH Projection Based Transformers', 'ta': 'முன்னோக்கி: சாதனத்தின் மேல் LSH திட்டப்பணி அடிப்படையான மாற்றுபவர்கள்', 'vi': 'Đã khởi đầu: Tới trình biến hình On-Device LSH', 'uz': 'Oldingi: Yuqoriga LSH loyihasi asosida tarjima qiluvchilar', 'da': 'ProFormer: På vej mod LSH projektionsbaserede transformatorer på enheden', 'bg': 'ProFormer: Към трансформатори, базирани на проекция LSH на устройства', 'hr': 'Predsjednik: prema projektiranju LSH na uređaju temeljenim transformatorima', 'nl': 'ProFormer: Naar On-Device LSH Projection Based Transformers', 'id': 'ProFormer: Towards On-Device LSH Projection Based Transformers', 'de': 'ProFormer: Auf dem Weg zu On-Device LSH Projektionstransformatoren', 'fa': 'پیشینیان: به سمت تغییرات بنیاد پروژه LSH روی دستگاه', 'ko': 'ProFormer: 장치에 대한 LSH 기반 프로젝터', 'sw': 'Mradi wa LSH', 'af': 'Voorwerper: Na Na Op- Toestel LSH Projek Based Transformers', 'tr': 'Esbap zolaky görkez', 'sq': 'ProFormer: drejt transformuesve të bazuar në projektimin LSH në pajisje', 'am': 'የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Pro-Պրոֆորմեր. Առաջ սարքի LSH պրոեկցիայի հիմնված վերափոխողներ', 'az': '∆èvv…ôlki: On-Device LSH Projection Based Transformers t…ôr…ôfind…ô', 'bn': 'প্রথম: ডিভাইস এলএসএইচ প্রজেক্টেশন ভিত্তিক ট্রান্সফর্মার', 'ca': 'ProFormer: Vers transformadors basats en projectes LSH', 'bs': 'Predsjednik: prema projektiranju LSH na uređaju temeljenim transformatorima', 'et': 'ProFormer: seadme LSH projektsioonipõhiste transformaatorite suunas', 'cs': 'ProFormer: Směrem k transformátorům založeným na projekci LSH na zařízení', 'fi': 'ProFormer: Kohti laitteiden LSH-projektioon perustuvia muuntajia', 'jv': 'Validity', 'sk': 'ProFormer: proti transformatorjem na osnovi projekcije LSH na napravi', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'ཚགས་མཁན：སྒྲིག་ཆས LSH་རྩ་སྒྲིག་གཞི་བརྗོད་མཁན་གྱི་འགྲོས', 'he': 'ProFormer: Towards On-Device LSH Projection Based Transformers'}
{'en': 'At the heart of text based neural models lay word representations, which are powerful but occupy a lot of memory making it challenging to deploy to devices with memory constraints such as mobile phones, watches and IoT. To surmount these challenges, we introduce ProFormer   a projection based transformer architecture that is faster and lighter making it suitable to deploy to memory constraint devices and preserve user privacy. We use LSH projection layer to dynamically generate word representations on-the-fly without embedding lookup tables leading to significant memory footprint reduction from O(V.d) to O(T), where V is the vocabulary size, d is the embedding dimension size and T is the dimension of the LSH projection representation. We also propose a local projection attention (LPA) layer, which uses self-attention to transform the input sequence of N LSH word projections into a sequence of N / K representations reducing the computations quadratically by O(K2). We evaluate ProFormer on multiple text classification tasks and observed improvements over prior state-of-the-art on-device approaches for short text classification and comparable performance for long text classification tasks. ProFormer is also competitive with other popular but highly resource-intensive approaches like BERT and even outperforms small-sized BERT variants with significant resource savings   reduces the embedding memory footprint from 92.16 MB to 1.7 KB and requires 16x less computation overhead, which is very impressive making it the fastest and smallest on-device model.', 'fr': "Au cœur des modèles neuronaux textuels se trouvent des représentations de mots, qui sont puissantes mais occupent beaucoup de mémoire, ce qui rend leur déploiement difficile sur des appareils soumis à des contraintes de mémoire tels que les téléphones mobiles, les montres et l'IoT. Pour relever ces défis, nous avons introduit ProFormer, une architecture de transformateur basée sur la projection qui est plus rapide et plus légère, ce qui permet de la déployer sur des dispositifs soumis à des contraintes de mémoire tout en préservant la confidentialité des utilisateurs. Nous utilisons la couche de projection LSH pour générer dynamiquement des représentations de mots à la volée sans intégrer de tables de recherche, ce qui entraîne une réduction significative de l'empreinte mémoire de O (V.d) à O (T), où V est la taille du vocabulaire, d est la taille de la dimension d'intégration et T est la dimension de la représentation de projection LSH. Nous proposons également une couche d'attention de projection locale (LPA), qui utilise l'attention personnelle pour transformer la séquence d'entrée de N projections de mots LSH en une séquence de N/K représentations réduisant les calculs quadratiques de O (K2). Nous évaluons ProFormer sur de multiples tâches de classification de texte et avons observé des améliorations par rapport aux approches avancées précédentes sur appareil pour la classification de textes courts et des performances comparables pour les tâches de classification de texte long. ProFormer est également compétitif par rapport à d'autres approches populaires mais très gourmandes en ressources, telles que BERT et surpasse même les variantes BERT de petite taille avec des économies de ressources significatives — réduit l'empreinte mémoire d'intégration de 92,16 Mo à 1,7 Ko et nécessite 16 fois moins de temps de calcul, ce qui\nest très impressionnant, ce qui en fait le modèle embarqué le plus rapide et le plus petit.", 'pt': 'No coração dos modelos neurais baseados em texto estão as representações de palavras, que são poderosas, mas ocupam muita memória, dificultando a implantação em dispositivos com restrições de memória, como telefones celulares, relógios e IoT. Para superar esses desafios, apresentamos o ProFormer – uma arquitetura de transformador baseada em projeção que é mais rápida e leve, tornando-a adequada para implantação em dispositivos de restrição de memória e preservação da privacidade do usuário. Usamos a camada de projeção LSH para gerar dinamicamente representações de palavras on-the-fly sem incorporar tabelas de pesquisa, levando a uma redução significativa do espaço de memória de O(V.d) para O(T), onde V é o tamanho do vocabulário, d é o tamanho da dimensão de incorporação e T é a dimensão da representação da projeção LSH. Também propomos uma camada de atenção à projeção local (LPA), que usa a autoatenção para transformar a sequência de entrada de N projeções de palavras LSH em uma sequência de representações N/K reduzindo os cálculos quadraticamente por O(K2). Avaliamos o ProFormer em várias tarefas de classificação de texto e observamos melhorias em abordagens de última geração no dispositivo para classificação de texto curto e desempenho comparável para tarefas de classificação de texto longo. O ProFormer também é competitivo com outras abordagens populares, mas altamente intensivas em recursos, como BERT e até supera variantes de BERT de pequeno porte com economia significativa de recursos - reduz a pegada de memória incorporada de 92,16 MB para 1,7 KB e requer 16x menos sobrecarga de computação, o que\né muito impressionante, tornando-o o modelo mais rápido e menor no dispositivo.', 'ar': 'في قلب النماذج العصبية القائمة على النصوص ، توجد تمثيلات للكلمات قوية ولكنها تشغل قدرًا كبيرًا من الذاكرة مما يجعل من الصعب نشرها على الأجهزة ذات قيود الذاكرة مثل الهواتف المحمولة والساعات وإنترنت الأشياء. للتغلب على هذه التحديات ، نقدم ProFormer - وهي بنية محولات قائمة على الإسقاط تكون أسرع وأخف وزنًا مما يجعلها مناسبة للنشر في أجهزة تقييد الذاكرة والحفاظ على خصوصية المستخدم. نحن نستخدم طبقة إسقاط LSH لإنشاء تمثيلات الكلمات بشكل ديناميكي أثناء التنقل دون تضمين جداول البحث مما يؤدي إلى تقليل بصمة الذاكرة بشكل كبير من O (V.d) إلى O (T) ، حيث V هو حجم المفردات ، و d هو حجم بُعد التضمين و T هو بُعد تمثيل إسقاط LSH. نقترح أيضًا طبقة انتباه الإسقاط المحلي (LPA) ، والتي تستخدم الانتباه الذاتي لتحويل تسلسل إدخال إسقاطات كلمة N LSH إلى سلسلة من تمثيلات N / K التي تقلل الحسابات تربيعيًا بواسطة يا (ك 2). نقوم بتقييم ProFormer على مهام تصنيف نصوص متعددة ونلاحظ التحسينات على أحدث الأساليب السابقة على الجهاز لتصنيف النص القصير والأداء القابل للمقارنة لمهام تصنيف النص الطويل. ProFormer منافس أيضًا مع الأساليب الأخرى الشائعة ولكن كثيفة الاستخدام للموارد مثل BERT وحتى يتفوق على متغيرات BERT صغيرة الحجم مع توفير كبير في الموارد - يقلل من أثر ذاكرة التضمين من 92.16 ميجابايت إلى 1.7 كيلوبايت ويتطلب 16x أقل من النفقات العامة ، والتي\nإنه أمر مثير للإعجاب للغاية مما يجعله أسرع وأصغر طراز على الجهاز.', 'es': 'En el corazón de los modelos neuronales basados en texto se encuentran las representaciones de palabras, que son poderosas pero que ocupan mucha memoria, lo que dificulta su implementación en dispositivos con limitaciones de memoria, como teléfonos móviles, relojes e IoT. Para superar estos desafíos, presentamos ProFormer, una arquitectura de transformador basada en proyecciones que es más rápida y liviana, por lo que es adecuada para implementarse en dispositivos con restricciones de memoria y preservar la privacidad del usuario. Utilizamos la capa de proyección LSH para generar dinámicamente representaciones de palabras sobre la marcha sin incluir tablas de búsqueda, lo que conduce a una reducción significativa de la huella de memoria de O (v.D) a O (T), donde V es el tamaño del vocabulario, d es el tamaño de la dimensión de incrustación y T es la dimensión de la representación de proyección LSH. También proponemos una capa de atención de proyección local (LPA), que utiliza la autoatención para transformar la secuencia de entrada de N proyecciones de palabras LSH en una secuencia de representaciones de N/K que reducen los cálculos cuadráticamente por O (K2). Evaluamos ProFormer en múltiples tareas de clasificación de texto y observamos mejoras con respecto a los enfoques anteriores de vanguardia en el dispositivo para la clasificación de textos cortos y un rendimiento comparable para las tareas de clasificación de texto largo ProFormer también es competitivo con otros enfoques populares pero que consumen muchos recursos, como BERT, e incluso supera a las variantes BERT de pequeño tamaño con un importante ahorro de recursos: reduce el espacio de memoria de incrustación de 92,16 MB a 1,7 KB y requiere 16 veces menos sobrecarga de computación, lo que\nes impresionante, lo que lo convierte en el modelo más rápido y pequeño del dispositivo.', 'zh': '夫文本之神经,单词也,功能强大也,而多用内存,故难于内存限,如手机手表和物联网。 为此挑战,推出ProFormer——一种基于投影之变压器架构,其愈疾愈轻,宜部署内存约束设备而护用户私。 吾以 LSH 投影为单词,而无嵌寻表,以显减 O(V.d) 至 O(T) 之内存占,其中 V 词汇大小,d 嵌维度大小,T LSH 投影之维度也。 又立局投影(LPA)层,自意输NLSH字投影者为N / K序,计量二减O(K2)。 估 ProFormer 之多端,观先进之备法,短文本之类,与长文之分者,比性有所改进。 ProFormer与他行而高资密集型之法(如BERT)竞,至优于小BERT变体,可省大资 - 嵌内存空92.16 MB减1.7 KB,而计费倍16\n甚令人印象深远,使为最速,最小者设备上型号。', 'hi': 'पाठ आधारित तंत्रिका मॉडल के दिल में शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व होते हैं, जो शक्तिशाली होते हैं, लेकिन बहुत सारी मेमोरी पर कब्जा कर लेते हैं जिससे मोबाइल फोन, घड़ियों और आईओटी जैसे मेमोरी बाधाओं वाले उपकरणों पर तैनात करना चुनौतीपूर्ण हो जाता है। इन चुनौतियों को पार करने के लिए, हम ProFormer पेश करते हैं - एक प्रक्षेपण आधारित ट्रांसफॉर्मर आर्किटेक्चर जो तेजी से और हल्का है जो इसे मेमोरी बाधा उपकरणों पर तैनात करने और उपयोगकर्ता की गोपनीयता को संरक्षित करने के लिए उपयुक्त बनाता है। हम एलएसएच प्रोजेक्शन परत का उपयोग गतिशील रूप से लुकअप तालिकाओं को एम्बेड किए बिना शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व ऑन-द-फ्लाई उत्पन्न करने के लिए करते हैं, जिससे ओ (वीडी) से ओ (टी) तक महत्वपूर्ण मेमोरी पदचिह्न में कमी होती है, जहां वी शब्दावली आकार है, डी एम्बेडिंग आयाम आकार है और टी एलएसएच प्रक्षेपण प्रतिनिधित्व का आयाम है। हम एक स्थानीय प्रक्षेपण ध्यान (एलपीए) परत का भी प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो एन एलएसएच शब्द अनुमानों के इनपुट अनुक्रम को एन / के प्रतिनिधित्व के अनुक्रम में बदलने के लिए आत्म-ध्यान का उपयोग करता है जो ओ (के 2) द्वारा गणनाओं को द्विघात रूप से कम करता है। हम कई पाठ वर्गीकरण कार्यों पर ProFormer का मूल्यांकन करते हैं और छोटे पाठ वर्गीकरण और लंबे पाठ वर्गीकरण कार्यों के लिए तुलनीय प्रदर्शन के लिए पूर्व राज्य-कला ऑन-डिवाइस दृष्टिकोणों पर सुधार देखते हैं। ProFormer BERT जैसे अन्य लोकप्रिय लेकिन अत्यधिक संसाधन-गहन दृष्टिकोणों के साथ भी प्रतिस्पर्धी है और यहां तक कि महत्वपूर्ण संसाधन बचत के साथ छोटे आकार के BERT वेरिएंट को भी मात देता है - एम्बेडिंग मेमोरी पदचिह्न को 92.16 MB से 1.7 KB तक कम कर देता है और इसके लिए 16x कम गणना ओवरहेड की आवश्यकता होती है, जो\nयह सबसे तेज और सबसे छोटा ऑन-डिवाइस मॉडल बनाने के लिए बहुत प्रभावशाली है।', 'ja': 'テキストベースのニューラルモデルの中心には、強力でありながら多くのメモリを占める単語表現があり、携帯電話、時計、IoTなどのメモリ制約のあるデバイスに展開するのは困難です。 これらの課題を克服するために、ProFormerを導入します。ProFormerは、プロジェクションベースの変圧器アーキテクチャで、メモリ制約デバイスに展開し、ユーザーのプライバシーを維持するのに適しています。 我々は、LSH投影層を使用して、O (V.d)からO (T)への著しいメモリフットプリントの減少をもたらすルックアップテーブルを埋め込まずに、単語表現をオンザフライで動的に生成し、ここで、Vは語彙サイズであり、dは埋め込み次元サイズであり、TはLSH投影表現の次元である。また、自己注目を使用して、N LSH単語投影の入力シーケンスをN/K表現のシーケンスに変換し、O (K 2)による計算を二次的に減少させるローカル投影注意(LPA)層を提案する。 私たちは、複数のテキスト分類タスクでProFormerを評価し、短いテキスト分類と長いテキスト分類タスクの同等のパフォーマンスのための従来の最先端のデバイス上のアプローチよりも改善を観察しました。 ProFormerは、BERTのような他の人気の高いリソース集約型アプローチと競合しており、大幅なリソース節約で小規模なBERTバリアントを上回っています。これにより、埋め込みメモリのフットプリントが92.16 MBから1.7 KBに削減され、計算オーバーヘッドが16倍削減されます。\nこれは非常に印象的で、デバイス上で最速かつ最小のモデルです。', 'ga': 'I gcroílár na samhlacha néaracha atá bunaithe ar théacs, leagadh léiriúcháin focal, atá cumhachtach ach a bhfuil a lán cuimhne orthu, rud a fhágann go bhfuil sé dúshlánach iad a imscaradh chuig gléasanna a bhfuil srianta cuimhne orthu mar fhóin phóca, uaireadóirí agus IoT. Chun na dúshláin seo a shárú, tugaimid isteach ProFormer - ailtireacht claochladáin bunaithe ar theilgean atá níos tapúla agus níos éadroime a fhágann go bhfuil sé oiriúnach le himscaradh chuig gléasanna srianta cuimhne agus a chaomhnaíonn príobháideacht an úsáideora. Bainimid úsáid as ciseal teilgin LSH chun léirithe focal a ghiniúint go dinimiciúil ar an eitilt gan táblaí cuardaigh a leabú as a dtiocfaidh laghdú suntasach ar lorg cuimhne ó O(V.d) go O(T), áit arb é V méid an stór focal, is é d an toise leabaithe agus Is é T toise an léiriú teilgean LSH. Molaimid freisin ciseal aird teilgean áitiúil (LPA), a úsáideann féinaird chun seicheamh ionchuir réamh-mheastacháin focal N LSH a athrú go seicheamh léirithe N/K ag laghdú na ríomhanna go ceathrúch de réir a chéile. Ó(K2). Déanaimid meastóireacht ar ProFormer ar thascanna iolracha aicmithe téacs agus chonaiceamar feabhsuithe ar chuir chuige ar an bhfeiste úrscothach a bhí ann roimhe seo maidir le haicmiú gearrthéacs agus feidhmíocht inchomparáide do thascanna fada aicmithe téacs. Tá ProFormer iomaíoch freisin le cineálacha cur chuige tóir eile ach an-dian ar acmhainní ar nós BERT agus fiú níos fearr ná leaganacha BERT beagmhéide le coigilteas suntasach acmhainní - laghdaítear lorg cuimhne leabaithe ó 92.16 MB go 1.7 KB agus éilíonn sé 16x níos lú ríomh lastuas, rud a\nan-suntasach, rud a fhágann gurb é an tsamhail ar an ngléas is tapúla agus is lú é.', 'ru': 'В основе основанных на тексте нейронных моделей лежали представления слов, которые являются мощными, но занимают много памяти, что затрудняет развертывание на устройствах с ограничениями памяти, таких как мобильные телефоны, часы и IoT. Чтобы преодолеть эти проблемы, мы представляем ProFormer - архитектуру трансформаторов на основе проекции, которая быстрее и легче, что делает ее подходящей для развертывания на устройствах с ограничениями памяти и сохранения конфиденциальности пользователей. Мы используем слой проекции LSH для динамического генерирования представлений слов на лету без встраивания таблиц поиска, что приводит к значительному уменьшению занимаемой памяти от O(V.d) до O(T), где V - размер словаря, d - размер размера вложения, а T - размер представления проекции LSH. Мы также предлагаем слой внимания локальной проекции (LPA), который использует самовнимание для преобразования входной последовательности проекций слов N LSH в последовательность представлений N/K, уменьшающих вычисления квадратично на O(K2). Мы оцениваем ProFormer по нескольким задачам классификации текста и наблюдаем улучшения по сравнению с предыдущими современными подходами к классификации короткого текста и сопоставимой производительности для задач классификации длинного текста. ProFormer также конкурирует с другими популярными, но очень ресурсоемкими подходами, такими как BERT, и даже превосходит малогабаритные варианты BERT со значительной экономией ресурсов – сокращает занимаемую память с 92,16 МБ до 1,7 КБ и требует в 16 раз меньше накладных расходов на вычисления, что\nочень впечатляет, что делает его самой быстрой и маленькой моделью на устройстве.', 'hu': 'Nagyon lenyűgöző, így ez a leggyorsabb és legkisebb eszköz modell.', 'ka': 'მნიშვნელოვანია, რომელიც მას უფრო სიჩქარე და უფრო პატარა მოდულია.', 'it': 'È molto impressionante che lo rende il più veloce e più piccolo modello on-device.', 'el': 'Είναι πολύ εντυπωσιακό καθιστώντας το ταχύτερο και μικρότερο μοντέλο στη συσκευή.', 'kk': 'Бұл құрылғының ең жылдам және ең кішкентай үлгісін өзгерту үшін әсер етеді.', 'lt': 'labai įspūdinga, kad ji taps greičiausia ir mažiausia įrenginio modeliu.', 'ms': 'sangat mengesankan menjadikannya model pada peranti yang paling cepat dan paling kecil.', 'mk': 'е многу импресивно што го прави најбрзиот и најмал модел на уредот.', 'mn': 'хамгийн хурдан, хамгийн жижиг төхөөрөмжийн загвар болгох нь маш гайхалтай.', 'ml': 'അത് വേഗത്തിലും ചെറുതായി ഉപകരണത്തിന്റെ മോഡല്\u200d ആക്കുന്നതാണ്.', 'mt': 'huwa impressjonanti ħafna li jagħmilha l-aktar mudell mgħaġġel u l-iżgħar fuq l-apparat.', 'no': 'er veldig uttrykkelig å gjera det raskest og minste på einingsmodellen.', 'sr': 'vrlo impresivno je što je najbrži i najmanji model na uređaju.', 'si': 'ඒක හරිම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ උපකරණයේ ඉක්මනට හා පොඩි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න.', 'so': 'waa mid aad u macquul ah oo ku sameynaya qaababka qalabka ugu dhaqso iyo ugu yar.', 'ta': 'is very impressive making it the fastest and smallest on-device model.', 'pl': 'Jest bardzo imponujący, czyniąc go najszybszym i najmniejszym modelem urządzenia.', 'ro': 'Este foarte impresionant, ceea ce îl face cel mai rapid și cel mai mic model de pe dispozitiv.', 'ur': 'بہت اثر دینے والی ہے کہ اسے سب سے تیز اور سب سے چھوٹا موڈل بنا دیتا ہے۔', 'sv': 'är mycket imponerande vilket gör den till den snabbaste och minsta modellen på enheten.', 'uz': "Matn asosida neyrolik modellarning qalinligi so'zlarni qo'shish mumkin. Bu so'zlar juda kuchli, lekin xotira qo'shish imkoniyatlarini xotira qilishini xotira qiladi, masalan uyali telefonlari, taqdim va IoT kabi imkoniyatlarni qo'yish imkoniyatlariga qarang. Bu muammolarni qidirish uchun, Biz Prozavchi - tashkilotni o'zgartirish asosida yaratish direktoriyatlarni ishlatib chiqaramiz. Bu tez va tezroq va fudud ishlatish uchun xotira cheksiz uskunalarni qo'yish va foydalanuvchining shaxsiyatlarini saqlash mumkin. Biz LSH процесс таркибида фойдаланиб, модений таркибида сўз кўринишларини яратиш учун фойдаланамиз, бу O(V.d) dan O(T) ga muhim xotira pastlarini kamaytirish mumkin. Biz lokal projeymatning taqdimotini taqdim qilamiz, bu N LSH soʻzning chegarasini o'zgartirish uchun o'zimni O(K2) tomonidan koʻpaytirish uchun o'zimni o'zgartiradi. Biz bir necha matn darajalashtirish vazifalarini qiymatmiz va bir necha matn darajalashtirish vazifalarini qiymatimiz va uzoq matn classification vazifalari uchun bir necha darajalashtirish vazifalarini oldin ishlab chiqaramiz. Birinchi muammoni boshqa popular bilan ishlab chiqaradi, lekin BERT kabi juda katta resource intensiv usullari bilan ishlab chiqaradi va ammo juda katta Resource Saqlovchisi bilan kichkina BERT varianterlarini bajaradi - 92. 16 MB dan 1. 7 Kb bilan kichik xotira boshlaydi va 16x qisqa hisoblash kerak.\njuda juda qiziqarli va eng tez va kichkina uskuna modelini yaratishdir.", 'vi': 'Tại trung tâm của các mô hình thần kinh dựa trên văn bản đã đặt các biểu hiện từ từ mạnh mẽ, nhưng chiếm được rất nhiều bộ nhớ làm cho nó thử thách để triển khai các thiết bị có hạn chế trí nhớ như điện thoại di động, đồng hồ và IO. Để vượt qua những thử thách này, chúng tôi giới thiệu ProFormer "a projection based transformer kiến trúc that is quickly and light making it appropriate to Triển khai to remember control devices và protect the user Private. Chúng tôi d ùng lớp phân phát LSH để tạo ra các biểu hiện từ từ trên máy bay mà không nhúng các bảng tìm kiếm dẫn tới một sự giảm lượng dấu chân bộ nhớ đáng kể từ O(V.d) sang O(T), nơi V là kích cỡ từ, d là kích cỡ chia cắt chiều không và T là chiều rộng của văn phòng LSD. Chúng tôi cũng đề nghị một lớp chú ý hình chiếu địa phương (LPA) dùng chính mình để chuyển đổi chuỗi nhập của dự đoán từ N LSH thành một dãy biểu tượng N/K để giảm dần tính to án theo phương trình O(K2). Chúng tôi đánh giá Procambarus về các công việc phân loại văn bản nhiều lần và đã có những cải tiến quan trọng hơn các tiến trình nội bộ của thiết bị cho việc phân loại văn bản ngắn và khả năng tương xứng cho các nhiệm vụ phân loại văn bản dài. ProFormer is also competition with other popular but highly resource-impressive approaches like BERT và even outthực to small-size BERT với significant resources - Chán the embedding memory Miss 92.16 MB to 1.7 KB and demanded 16x less computetion overside, which which which:\nrất ấn tượng làm nó trở thành mô hình máy nhanh nhất và nhỏ nhất.', 'de': 'Es ist das schnellste und kleinste On-Device-Modell.', 'hr': 'vrlo impresivno je činiti ga najbržim i najmanjim modelom na uređaju.', 'nl': 'Het is zeer indrukwekkend waardoor het het snelste en kleinste on-device model is.', 'bg': 'е много впечатляващо, което го прави най-бързият и най-малък модел на устройството.', 'da': 'er meget imponerende, hvilket gør det til den hurtigste og mindste on-device model.', 'ko': '가장 빠르고 가장 작은 설비 모델로 기억에 남는다.', 'id': 'sangat mengesankan membuatnya model yang paling cepat dan paling kecil pada perangkat.', 'sw': 'ni jambo la kushangaza sana na kuifanya vifaa vya haraka na kidogo zaidi.', 'fa': 'بسیار تحت تاثیر انگیز است که آن را سریعترین و کوچکترین مدل روی دستگاه انجام دهد.', 'tr': 'janla힊dyrmak i흫 챌alt we i흫 ki챌i g철rkezil첵채n nusga 체챌in 철r채n t채sirli.', 'af': 'is baie inpresief om dit te maak die vinnigste en kleinste op-toestelmodel.', 'sq': 'Ă«shtĂ« shumĂ« mbresĂ«lĂ«nĂ«se duke e bĂ«rĂ« modelin mĂ« tĂ« shpejtĂ« dhe mĂ« tĂ« vogĂ«l nĂ« pajisje.', 'am': 'በጣም ፈጥኖ እና በጣም ትንሽ በሀብት ሞዴል ማድረግ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'շատ տպավորիչ է դարձնում այն ամենաարագ և ամենափոքր սարքի մոդելը:', 'bn': 'খুব চমৎকার যে এটাকে সবচেয়ে দ্রুত এবং সর্বোচ্চ মডেল বানিয়ে দেয়।', 'bs': 'vrlo impresivno je činiti ga najbržim i najmanjim modelom na uređaju.', 'cs': 'Je velmi působivý, což z něj dělá nejrychlejší a nejmenší model na zařízení.', 'az': '톛n h캼zl캼 v톛 톛n ki칞ik avadanl캼q modelini t톛sir edir.', 'et': 'See on väga muljetavaldav, muutes selle kõige kiiremaks ja väiksemaks seadme mudeliks.', 'fi': 'Se on erittäin vaikuttava tehden siitä nopeimman ja pienimmän laitteen malli.', 'ca': 'és molt impressionant fer-lo el model més ràpid i més petit.', 'sk': 'V središču besedilnih nevronskih modelov ležijo besedne predstavitve, ki so zmogljive, vendar zasedajo veliko pomnilnika, zaradi česar je težko uvajati naprave z omejitvami pomnilnika, kot so mobilni telefoni, ure in IoT. Da bi premagali te izzive, predstavljamo ProFormer - projekcijsko transformatorsko arhitekturo, ki je hitrejša in lažja, zaradi česar je primerna za uvajanje v naprave z omejitvami pomnilnika in ohranjanje zasebnosti uporabnikov. Projekcijski sloj LSH uporabljamo za dinamično ustvarjanje besednih predstavitev v trenutku brez vdelave iskalnih tabel, ki vodijo do znatnega zmanjšanja pomnilniškega odtisa iz O(V.d) v O(T), kjer je V velikost besedišča, d velikost dimenzije vdelave in T dimenzija projekcijske predstavitve LSH. Predlagamo tudi sloj lokalne projekcijske pozornosti (LPA), ki uporablja samopozornost za pretvorbo vhodnega zaporedja N LSH besednih projekcij v zaporedje N/K reprezentacij, ki kvadratno zmanjšuje izračune z O(K2). Ocenjujemo ProFormer pri več opravilih klasifikacije besedil in opažamo izboljšave v primerjavi s predhodnimi najsodobnejšimi pristopi na napravi za klasifikacijo kratkega besedila in primerljivo zmogljivost pri opravilih klasifikacije dolgega besedila. ProFormer je konkurenčen tudi z drugimi priljubljenimi, vendar zelo intenzivnimi pristopi, kot je BERT, in celo presega majhne različice BERT z znatnimi prihranki virov - zmanjšuje odtis pomnilnika za vdelavo z 92,16 MB na 1,7 KB in zahteva 16-krat manj stroškov računalništva, kar\nZato je najhitrejši in najmanjši model na napravi.', 'ha': "A cikin ƙirin misalin misãlai na rubutu na rubutu, sai ya sanya masu tsari ga maganar, waɗand a ke da ƙarfi kuma ke riƙon memory masu ƙaranci da kwamfyutan ya kamata a deploy ayuka da tsarin memory kamar misalin mobile, da gane da IoT. To, ka samu wannan zane, za mu ƙara wa ProFormer - wata matsayi mai shigewa wanda aka ƙayyade shi na zama mai gaggãwa da sauri, kuma yana da amfani da shi don ya gyara a lokacin kumbar da za'a lissafa kuma don ka tsare faras na mai amfani da shi. Tuna amfani da layin LSH d on ka sami magana masu gaya kan-fukafa kuma bã da mai lokacin looketa filayen da za'a yi amfani da shi mai girma wa kwantarwa na lokacin memory daga O(V.d) zuwa O(T), inda V ke girma ga maganar, d ne girmar diguwar da ke faɗaɗawa kuma T yana da girmar shirin da ake wakilisha LSH. Tune ƙayyade wani fassarar muhalli na lokaci (LPA), wanda ke amfani da kansa dõmin ya canza muhallin da ke cikin tsarin ayuka na N LSH zuwa wani sequence na masu tsari na N/K, da ya ƙara lissafan da aka ƙayyade lissafan da O(K2). Kana ƙaddara Mazaman a kan aikin misalin matsayi masu yawa kuma munã gani improvements don gabanin-state-the-art kan zance-zane za'a yi amfani da fasalin matsayi kaɗan da ya kamata aikin fasalin matsayin mai tsawo. @ action: button\nIna kamfata ta zama mafi sauri da ƙaranci kan shirin ayuka.", 'bo': 'At the heart of text based neural models lay word representations, which are powerful but occupy a lot of memory making it challenging to deploy to devices with memory constraints such as mobile phones, watches and IoT. To surmount these challenges, we introduce ProFormer - a projection based transformer architecture that is faster and lighter making it suitable to deploy to memory constraint devices and preserve user privacy. We use LSH projection layer to dynamically generate word representations on-the-fly without embedding lookup tables leading to significant memory footprint reduction from O(V.d) to O(T), where V is the vocabulary size, d is the embedding dimension size and T is the dimension of the LSH projection representation. We also propose a local projection attention (LPA) layer, which uses self-attention to transform the input sequence of N LSH word projections into a sequence of N/K representations reducing the computations quadratically by O(K2). We evaluate ProFormer on multiple text classification tasks and observed improvements over prior state-of-the-art on-device approaches for short text classification and comparable performance for long text classification tasks. ProFormer is also competitive with other popular but highly resource-intensive approaches like BERT and even outperforms small-sized BERT variants with significant resource savings - reduces the embedding memory footprint from 92.16 MB to 1.7 KB and requires 16x less computation overhead, which requires 16x less\nལག་ཆས་གཞུང་གིས་མཐུན་བཟོ་མི་མཐའ་དང་ཆུང་ཤོས་ཡོད་པ་བཟོ་བྱས་ཡོད།', 'jv': 'text-tool-action To surmount this shock, we present Proformer - a proction-supported transformer architecture that is fast and brighter Speaking We tamben suggerejar un lokal procheksi atensi (LPA) layer, usada Self-atensi kanggo transform input sewensi nggambar uwong "N LH word Projections" in a sewensi wis disebarke input sewensi N/K representations que nullahirga informasi cadata le O(K2). We assess Proformer on multitext CLASS tasks and noted advancements before state-of-the-arton-device accesses for short text CLASS and conversable output for long text CLASS tasks. Click here to read the input. section\nAwak dhéwé sing paling apik tenan ngono model sing paling tele', 'he': 'At the heart of text based neural models lay word representations, which are powerful but occupy a lot of memory making it challenging to deploy to devices with memory constraints such as mobile phones, watches and IoT.  To surmount these challenges, we introduce ProFormer - a projection based transformer architecture that is faster and lighter making it suitable to deploy to memory constraint devices and preserve user privacy.  אנו משתמשים בשכבת פריקציה LSH כדי ליצור דינמונית מייצגות מילים על-טס בלי להכניס שולחנות חיפוש שמובילות להפחית משמעותית של טביעת רגל זיכרון מ O(V.d) ל O(T), איפה V הוא גודל המילונים, d הוא גודל המימד של ההכניסה וטי הוא המימד של מייצג פריקציה LSH. אנחנו גם מציעים שכבה של תשומת לב פריקציה מקומית (LPA), אשר משתמשת בשימוש תשומת לב עצמית כדי לשנות את רצף הכניסה של פריקציות מילים N LSH לרצף של מייצגים N/K שמפחידים את החישובים בצורה רביעית על ידי O(K2). אנו מעריכים את ProFormer על משימות מסווג טקסט מרובות והצפינו בשיפורים מעל גישות מוקדמות של המכשיר למצב מסווג טקסט קצר והביצועים שווים למשימות מסווג טקסט ארוכות. ProFormer is also competitive with other popular but highly resource-intensive approaches like BERT and even outperforms small-sized BERT variants with significant resource savings - reduces the embedding memory footprint from 92.16 MB to 1.7 KB and requires 16x less computation overhead, which\nis very impressive making it the fastest and smallest on-device model.'}
{'en': 'Crisscrossed Captions : Extended Intramodal and Intermodal Semantic Similarity Judgments for MS-COCO', 'ar': 'التعليقات المتقاطعة: أحكام التشابه الدلالي متعددة الوسائط والداخلية الموسعة لـ MS-COCO', 'fr': 'Sous-titres entrecroisés\xa0: Jugements de similitude sémantique intramodale et intermodale étendus pour MS-COCO', 'es': 'Subtítulos entrecruzados: Juicios de similitud semántica intramodal e intermodal ampliados para MS-COCO', 'pt': 'Legendas cruzadas: julgamentos estendidos de semelhança semântica intramodal e intermodal para MS-COCO', 'ja': 'Crisscrossed Captions: Extended Intramodal and Intermodal Semantic Similarity Judgments for MS - COCO', 'zh': '纵横之题:MS-COCO之广内联与多式联运语义相似性决', 'ru': 'Перекрестные заголовки: расширенные внутримодальные и интермодальные суждения о семантическом сходстве для MS-COCO', 'hi': 'Crisscrossed कैप्शन: एमएस-कोको के लिए विस्तारित इंट्रामोडल और इंटरमोडल सिमेंटिक समानता निर्णय', 'ga': 'Fotheidil Crisscrossed: Breithiúnais Chomhchosúlachta Shéimeantach Intramodal agus Idirmhódúil Leathnaithe do MS-COCO', 'hu': 'Válogatott feliratok: kiterjesztett intramodális és intermodális szemantikus hasonlósági ítéletek MS-COCO esetében', 'el': 'Επικεφαλής τίτλος: Εκτεταμένες αποφάσεις ενδοmodaler και διατροπικής σημασιολογικής ομοιότητας για MS-COCO', 'ka': 'კრისკროსური შესახებ: გაფართებული ინტრამოდელური და ინტერმოდელური Semantic Similarity Judgments for MS- COCO', 'it': 'Didascalie a croce: sentenze estese di somiglianza semantica intramodale e intermodale per MS-COCO', 'kk': 'Крискросс айдарлары: MS- COCO үшін интрамодалық және интермодалық Semantic Similarity Judgments', 'lt': 'Krizių kryžminiai žodžiai: išplėsti valstybių narių – COCO – vidaus ir tarpmodalinio semestinio panašumo sprendimai', 'ms': 'Crisscrossed Captions: Extended Intramodal and Intermodal Semantic Similarity Judgments for MS-COCO', 'mk': 'Крискросирани наслови: Проширени интрамодални и интермодални семантични судии за сличност за MS-COCO', 'no': 'Krysskrosserte tittel: Utvida intermodal og intermodal semantisk forskjellighetsjustering for MS- COCO', 'pl': 'Podpisy kryzysowe: Rozszerzone wyroki dotyczące podobieństwa semantycznego w odniesieniu do MS-COCO', 'mn': 'Крискросс дурангууд: MS-COCO-ын интрамодал болон интермодал төстэй ижил төстэй шүүмжүүд', 'ml': 'ക്രിസ്ക്രോസ് ചെയ്ത പ്രമേയങ്ങള്\u200d: എസ്- കോക്കോയ്ക്ക് വേണ്ടി വിശാലമായ ഇന്റ്രാമോഡാലും ഇന്റര്\u200dമോഡാല്\u200d സെമാന്റ', 'sr': 'Raskrivena kapcija: Prošireni rasuđivanje intrramodalne i intermodalne semantičke sličnosti za MS-COCO', 'ro': 'Titluri clasice: Hotărâri extinse privind similitudinea semantică intramodală și intermodală pentru MS-COCO', 'mt': 'Crisscrossed Captions: Extended Intramodal and Intermodal Semantic Similarity Judgments for MS-COCO', 'so': 'Crisscross Captions: Extended Intramodal and Intermodal Semantic Similarity Judges for MS-CO', 'sv': 'Kryssformade bildtexter: Utvidgade domar om intramodal och intermodal semantisk likhet för MS-COCO', 'si': 'Crisscrossed Captions: විස්තාරිත සිමාන්තික සිමාන්තික විශ්වාසය MS-COCO සඳහා', 'ta': 'சிகிரிஸ் தலைப்புகள்: MS- CO க்கான விரிவாக்கப்பட்ட Intramodal மற்றும் Intermodal Semantic Similarity தீர்ப்புகள்', 'ur': 'کریسسکروس کیپٹینز: MS-COCO کے لئے پھیلائی Intramodal and Intermodal Semantic Similarity Judgments', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Các phim khủng khiếp: Các quyết định tương đồng truyền thống truyền thống và truyền thống.', 'hr': 'Raskrsnuti načini: Prošireni rasuđivanje intrramodalne i intermodalne semantičke sličnosti za MS-COCO', 'bg': 'Крискрозирани надписи: Разширени решения за интрамодална и интермодална семантична сходство за МС-КОКО', 'nl': 'Crissgescrossed ondertitels: Uitgebreide intramodale en intermodale semantische gelijkenisoordelen voor MS-COCO', 'de': 'Crissscrossed Untertitel: Erweiterte intramodale und intermodale semantische Ähnlichkeitsurteile für MS-COCO', 'id': 'Capsi Crisscrossed: Penghakiman Semantik Intramodal dan Intermodal Terluas untuk MS-COCO', 'da': 'Krydsrullede billedtekster: Udvidede domme om intramodal og intermodal semantisk lighed for MS-COCO', 'ko': '교차 자막: MS-COCO의 확장 모드 내와 모드 간 의미 유사성 판단', 'fa': 'کاپیتان\u200cهای کریسکروس: قضاوت\u200cهای شبیه\u200cانگیزی داخلی و منطقه\u200cای برای MS-COCO گسترده شده', 'sw': 'Makala yaliyokosolewa: Mahakama ya Kitengo cha Intramodal na Kimataifa kwa ajili ya MS-CO', 'tr': 'Crisscrossed Captions: Extended Intramodal and Intermodal Semantic Similarity Judgments for MS-COCO', 'hy': 'Քրիսխրոսխային գլխարկներ. ՄՍ-ԿոԿՕ-ի համար ընդլայնված ինտրամոդալ և ինտերմոդալ սեմատիկ նման դատողություններ', 'af': 'Crisscrossed Titels: uitgebreide Intramodaal en Intermodaal Semantiese Ligtigheid Verordeninge vir MS- COCO', 'sq': 'Kapsionet e kryqëzuara: Gjykimet e zgjeruara të ngjashmërisë Semantike Intramodale dhe Intermodale për MS-COCO', 'az': 'Crisscrossed Captions: Extended Intramodal and Intermodal Semantic Similarity Judgments for MS-COCO', 'am': 'የስሕተት አርእስቶች: Extended Intramodal and Intermodal Semantic Similarity Judges for MS-CO', 'bs': 'Raskrsnuti kapiji: Prošireni sudovi o intramodalnoj i intermodalnoj semantičkoj sličnosti za MS-COCO', 'bn': 'সমালোচনার শিরোনাম: MS-CO এর জন্য বিস্তৃত ইন্ট্রামোডাল এবং ইন্টারমডাল সেম্যান্ডিক সেমান্টিক বিচার', 'cs': 'Krizové titulky: Rozšířené rozsudky o intramodální a intermodální sémantické podobnosti pro MS-COCO', 'fi': 'Crisscrossed captions: Extended intramodal and intermodal semantic similarity tuomiot MS-COCO', 'ca': 'Capcions transversals: Sentences extenses de Semància Semàtica Intramodal i Intermodal per MS-COCO', 'et': 'Kriisilised pealkirjad: MS-COCO laiendatud intramodaalse ja intermodaalse semantilise sarnasuse kohtuotsused', 'he': 'תורגם ע"י Crisscrossed Captions: Extended Intramodal and Intermodal Semantic Similarity Judgments for MS-COCO', 'sk': 'Krizni napisi: Razširjene intramodalne in intermodalne semantične podobnosti sodbe za MS-COCO', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Crisscrossed Captions: Extended Intramodal and Intermodal Semantic Similarity Judgments for MS-COCO', 'jv': 'kriScroosed Captions: Expanded Intramadal and intermodal semanti Similrity judgments for CS-COMO'}
{'en': 'By supporting multi-modal retrieval training and evaluation, image captioning datasets have spurred remarkable progress on representation learning. Unfortunately, datasets have limited cross-modal associations : images are not paired with other images, captions are only paired with other captions of the same image, there are no negative associations and there are missing positive cross-modal associations. This undermines research into how inter-modality learning impacts intra-modality tasks. We address this gap with Crisscrossed Captions (CxC), an extension of the MS-COCO dataset with human semantic similarity judgments for 267,095 intra- and inter-modality pairs. We report baseline results on CxC for strong existing unimodal and multimodal models. We also evaluate a multitask dual encoder trained on both image-caption and caption-caption pairs that crucially demonstrates CxC’s value for measuring the influence of intra- and inter-modality learning.', 'ar': 'من خلال دعم التدريب على الاسترجاع متعدد الوسائط والتقييم ، حفزت مجموعات بيانات الصور التوضيحية تقدمًا ملحوظًا في تعلم التمثيل. لسوء الحظ ، تحتوي مجموعات البيانات على ارتباطات محدودة عبر الوسائط: لا يتم إقران الصور مع الصور الأخرى ، ويتم إقران التسميات التوضيحية فقط مع التسميات التوضيحية الأخرى للصورة نفسها ، ولا توجد ارتباطات سلبية ولا توجد ارتباطات موجبة عبر الوسائط. هذا يقوض البحث في كيفية تأثير التعلم متعدد الوسائط على المهام داخل الوسائط. نعالج هذه الفجوة باستخدام Crisscrossed Captions (CxC) ، وهو امتداد لمجموعة بيانات MS-COCO مع أحكام تشابه دلالي بشرية لـ 267095 زوجًا داخليًا ومتعدد الأساليب. نقوم بالإبلاغ عن نتائج خط الأساس على CxC للنماذج القوية الحالية أحادية الوسائط ومتعددة الوسائط. نقوم أيضًا بتقييم برنامج تشفير مزدوج متعدد المهام تم تدريبه على كل من أزواج التعليقات التوضيحية والصورة والتعليقات التوضيحية التي توضح بشكل حاسم قيمة CxC لقياس تأثير التعلم داخل الوسائط ومتعددها.', 'fr': "En prenant en charge la formation et l'évaluation de la récupération multimodale, les ensembles de données de sous-titrage d'images ont stimulé des progrès remarquables en matière d'apprentissage des représentations. Malheureusement, les ensembles de données ont des associations intermodales limitées\xa0: les images ne sont pas appariées avec d'autres images, les légendes sont uniquement associées à d'autres légendes de la même image, il n'y a pas d'association négative et il manque des associations intermodales positives. Cela mine la recherche sur l'impact de l'apprentissage intermodalité sur les tâches intra-modales. Nous comblons cette lacune avec Crisscrossed Captions (CxC), une extension de l'ensemble de données MS-COCO avec des jugements de similarité sémantique humaine pour 267 095 paires intra et intermodalité. Nous présentons des résultats de référence sur la CxC pour des modèles unimodaux et multimodaux solides existants. Nous évaluons également un codeur double multitâche entraîné à la fois sur des paires image-légende et légende-légende qui démontre de manière cruciale la valeur de CxC pour mesurer l'influence de l'apprentissage intra et intermodalité.", 'es': 'Al apoyar la capacitación y la evaluación de recuperación multimodal, los conjuntos de datos de subtítulos de imágenes han impulsado un progreso notable en el aprendizaje de la representación. Desafortunadamente, los conjuntos de datos tienen asociaciones intermodales limitadas: las imágenes no se emparejan con otras imágenes, los subtítulos solo se emparejan con otros subtítulos de la misma imagen, no hay asociaciones negativas y faltan asociaciones intermodales positivas. Esto socava la investigación sobre cómo el aprendizaje intermodal impacta en las tareas intramodales. Abordamos esta brecha con Crisscrossed Captions (CxC), una extensión del conjunto de datos MS-COCO con juicios de similitud semántica humana para 267.095 pares intra e intermodalidad. Presentamos los resultados de referencia en CxC para modelos unimodales y multimodales sólidos existentes. También evaluamos un codificador dual multitarea entrenado en pares de subtítulos de imagen y subtítulos que demuestra de manera crucial el valor de CxC para medir la influencia del aprendizaje intra e intermodal.', 'pt': 'Ao oferecer suporte ao treinamento e avaliação de recuperação multimodal, os conjuntos de dados de legendagem de imagens estimularam um progresso notável no aprendizado de representação. Infelizmente, os conjuntos de dados têm associações multimodais limitadas: as imagens não são emparelhadas com outras imagens, as legendas são emparelhadas apenas com outras legendas da mesma imagem, não há associações negativas e estão ausentes associações modais cruzadas positivas. Isso prejudica a pesquisa sobre como a aprendizagem intermodal afeta as tarefas intramodal. Abordamos essa lacuna com legendas cruzadas (CxC), uma extensão do conjunto de dados MS-COCO com julgamentos de semelhança semântica humana para 267.095 pares intra e intermodalidade. Relatamos resultados de linha de base em CxC para modelos unimodais e multimodais fortes existentes. Também avaliamos um codificador duplo multitarefa treinado em pares de legenda e legenda de imagem que demonstra crucialmente o valor do CxC para medir a influência do aprendizado intra e intermodalidade.', 'ja': 'マルチモーダル検索トレーニングと評価をサポートすることで、画像キャプションデータセットは表現学習の顕著な進歩を促進しました。残念ながら、データセットのクロスモーダル関連付けは限られています。画像は他の画像とペアになっておらず、キャプションは同じ画像の他のキャプションとペアになっているだけで、負の関連付けはなく、正のクロスモーダル関連付けはありません。これは、モダリティ間学習がモダリティ内タスクにどのように影響するかに関する研究を損なう。我々は、267,095のモーダリティ内およびモーダリティ間のペアについてのヒトのセマンティック類似性判定を備えたMS - COCOデータセットの拡張であるCrisscrossed Captions (CxC)でこのギャップに対処する。強力な既存の単式およびマルチモーダルモデルのCxCのベースライン結果を報告します。また、画像キャプションとキャプションの両方のペアでトレーニングされたマルチタスクデュアルエンコーダーを評価します。これは、モーダリティ内およびモーダリティ間の学習の影響を測定するためのCxCの価値を重要に示します。', 'ru': 'Поддерживая обучение и оценку мультимодального поиска, наборы данных для подписи к изображениям способствовали значительному прогрессу в обучении репрезентации. К сожалению, наборы данных имеют ограниченные кросс-модальные ассоциации: изображения не спариваются с другими изображениями, подписи спариваются только с другими подписями того же изображения, нет отрицательных связей и отсутствуют положительные кросс-модальные связи. Это подрывает исследования о том, как интермодальное обучение влияет на внутримодальные задачи. Мы устраняем этот пробел с помощью перекрестных заголовков (CxC), расширения набора данных MS-COCO с оценками семантического сходства человека для 267 095 внутримодальных и межмодальных пар. Мы сообщаем исходные результаты по CxC для надежных существующих моделей для отдельных видов транспорта и смешанных моделей. Мы также оцениваем многозадачный двойной кодировщик, обученный как парам захвата изображений, так и парам субтитров, который критически демонстрирует ценность CxC для измерения влияния внутримодального и интермодального обучения.', 'zh': '多模态检练评估,图像字幕数集于学。 不幸者,数集有限跨模态关联:图不与他配对,标题仅与同题配对,不负关联,且缺正跨模态联。 此坏模态间学模态内事也。 CxC)以纵横之标(CxC)决此差,CxCMS-COCO数集之广,有267,095模态内模态间人语义相似性决之。 以告 CxC 之强大单式与多式联运之基线也。 又评图像-标题-标对上练之多任务双编码器,当编码器至要而证之CxC量模内模态之间学之价。', 'hi': 'मल्टी-मोडल पुनर्प्राप्ति प्रशिक्षण और मूल्यांकन का समर्थन करके, छवि कैप्शनिंग डेटासेट ने प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने पर उल्लेखनीय प्रगति को प्रेरित किया है। दुर्भाग्य से, डेटासेट में सीमित क्रॉस-मोडल एसोसिएशन हैं: छवियों को अन्य छवियों के साथ जोड़ा नहीं जाता है, कैप्शन केवल एक ही छवि के अन्य कैप्शन के साथ जोड़े जाते हैं, कोई नकारात्मक संघ नहीं हैं और सकारात्मक क्रॉस-मोडल संघों की कमी है। यह अनुसंधान को कमजोर करता है कि अंतर-साधन सीखने इंट्रा-मोडलिटी कार्यों को कैसे प्रभावित करता है। हम इस अंतर को क्रिसक्रॉस्ड कैप्शन (सीएक्ससी) के साथ संबोधित करते हैं, जो 267,095 इंट्रा- और इंटर-मोडलिटी जोड़े के लिए मानव शब्दार्थ समानता निर्णय के साथ एमएस-कोको डेटासेट का एक विस्तार है। हम मजबूत मौजूदा यूनिमोडल और मल्टीमॉडल मॉडल के लिए सीएक्ससी पर बेसलाइन परिणामों की रिपोर्ट करते हैं। हम छवि-कैप्शन और कैप्शन-कैप्शन जोड़े दोनों पर प्रशिक्षित एक मल्टीटास्क दोहरे एनकोडर का भी मूल्यांकन करते हैं जो महत्वपूर्ण रूप से इंट्रा- और इंटर-मोडलिटी लर्निंग के प्रभाव को मापने के लिए सीएक्ससी के मूल्य को प्रदर्शित करता है।', 'ga': 'Trí thacú le hoiliúint agus le meastóireacht ilmhódúil aisghabhála, spreag tacair shonraí um theidealú íomhánna dul chun cinn suntasach ar fhoghlaim ionadaíochta. Ar an drochuair, tá comhcheangail thrasmhódúla teoranta ag tacair sonraí: ní dhéantar íomhánna a phéireáil le híomhánna eile, ní dhéantar fortheidil a phéireáil ach le fotheidil eile den íomhá chéanna, níl aon chomhcheangail dhiúltacha ann agus tá comhlachais thrasmhódúla dearfacha in easnamh. Baineann sé seo an bonn ó thaighde ar an tionchar a bhíonn ag foghlaim idirmhódúlachta ar thascanna inmhódúlachta. Tugaimid aghaidh ar an mbearna seo le Fotheidil Crisscrossed (CxC), síneadh ar an tacar sonraí MS-COCO le breithiúnais chosúlachta shéimeantaigh dhaonna do 267,095 péire inmhódúlachta agus idirmhódúlachta. Tuairiscímid torthaí bonnlíne ar CxC do mhúnlaí láidre aonmhódacha agus ilmhódacha atá ann cheana féin. Déanaimid meastóireacht freisin ar ionchódóir déach il-thasc atá oilte ar phéirí íomhá-theideal agus ceannteideal a léiríonn go ríthábhachtach an luach atá ag CxC maidir le tionchar na foghlama laistigh agus idirmhódúlachta a thomhas.', 'el': 'Υποστηρίζοντας την εκπαίδευση και την αξιολόγηση πολλαπλών τρόπων ανάκτησης, τα σύνολα δεδομένων λεζάντας εικόνων έχουν προκαλέσει αξιοσημείωτη πρόοδο στη μάθηση αναπαράστασης. Δυστυχώς, τα σύνολα δεδομένων έχουν περιορισμένες διασυνδέσεις: οι εικόνες δεν συνδυάζονται με άλλες εικόνες, οι λεζάντες συνδυάζονται μόνο με άλλες λεζάντες της ίδιας εικόνας, δεν υπάρχουν αρνητικές συσχετίσεις και λείπουν θετικές διασυνδέσεις. Αυτό υπονομεύει την έρευνα σχετικά με τον τρόπο με τον οποίο η διαπροπική μάθηση επηρεάζει τα καθήκοντα ενδοmodality. Αντιμετωπίζουμε αυτό το χάσμα με Crissscrooss Titions (CxC), μια επέκταση του συνόλου δεδομένων MS-COCO με ανθρώπινες σημασιολογικές ομοιότητες για 267,095 ζεύγη ενδο- και ενδοmodality. Αναφέρουμε βασικά αποτελέσματα για το CxC για ισχυρά υπάρχοντα μονοmodale και πολυmodale μοντέλα. Αξιολογούμε επίσης έναν πολυλειτουργικό διπλό κωδικοποιητή εκπαιδευμένο τόσο σε ζεύγη εικόνας-λεζάντας όσο και λεζάντας-λεζάντας που καταδεικνύει καθοριστικά την αξία του για τη μέτρηση της επιρροής της ενδο- και διαμεσολαβητικής μάθησης.', 'ka': 'მრავალმედი მოდიალური გავიღოთ განსწავლების და განსაზღვრების მიხედვით, გამოსახულების შესაძლებელი მონაცემების შესაძლებელი პროგრესი განსწავლების შესაძლებელად გამოიყენებ მართლად, მონაცემების კონფიგურაციები აქვს გადარჩენებული კრისმოდიალური აზოციაციები: გამოსახულები სხვა გამოსახულებით არიან დაკავშირებული, შესახებ მხოლოდ სხვა გამოსახულებით დაკავშირებული, არიან დარ ეს მოდილიტების შესახებ, როგორ მოდილიტების შესახებ მოდილიტების შესახებ. ჩვენ ამ განსხვავებას კრისკროსური კატაციებით (CxC), MS-COCO მონაცემების მონაცემების განსხვავება, რომელიც ადამიანის სენმანტიკური განსხვავებებით 267 095 ინტერული და ინტერმოდილიტური კოსტაციების განსხვავ ჩვენ CxC-ის მუშაობელი უნიმოდეალური და მულტიმოდეალური მოდელებისთვის შეტყობინებთ. ჩვენ ასევე მრავალ დავამუშავებთ ეუალური კოდერი, რომელიც გამოსახულებული სახელსაწყოთან და სახელსაწყოთან სახელსაწყოთან მრავალური კოდერის მნიშვნელობა CxC-ის მნიშვნელობა, რომელიც ინტერე- და ინტე', 'hu': 'A multimodális visszakeresési képzés és értékelés támogatásával a képalkotó adatkészletek figyelemreméltó előrelépést eredményeztek a reprezentációs tanulás terén. Sajnos az adatkészleteknek korlátozott mértékben vannak transzmodális asszociációi: a képeket nem párosítják más képekkel, a feliratokat csak ugyanannak a képnek a többi feliratával párosítják, nincsenek negatív asszociációk és hiányoznak pozitív transzmodális asszociációk. Ez aláássa azt a kutatást, hogy az intermodális tanulás milyen hatással van az intermodális feladatokra. Ezt a hiányt a Crisscrossed Captions (CxC) segítségével kezeljük, amely az MS-COCO adatkészlet kiterjesztése 267 095 intra- és intermodalitási párra vonatkozó humán szemantikai hasonlósági ítéletekkel. Az erős unimodális és multimodális modellek esetében jelentjük a CxC alapvető eredményeit. Emellett értékelünk egy multifeladatos kettős kódolót, amely mind a kép-felirat, mind a felirat-felirat párokra képzett, és amely alapvetően bizonyítja a CxC értékét az intra- és intermodalitás tanulás hatásának mérésében.', 'it': "Sostenendo la formazione e la valutazione multimodali di recupero, i set di dati per la didascalia delle immagini hanno stimolato notevoli progressi nell'apprendimento della rappresentazione. Purtroppo, i dataset hanno associazioni cross-modali limitate: le immagini non sono accoppiate ad altre immagini, le didascalie sono accoppiate solo ad altre didascalie della stessa immagine, non ci sono associazioni negative e mancano associazioni cross-modali positive. Ciò compromette la ricerca sull'impatto dell'apprendimento intermodale sui compiti intramodali. Affrontiamo questo gap con Crisscrossed Captions (CxC), un'estensione del dataset MS-COCO con giudizi di somiglianza semantica umana per 267.095 coppie intra- e intermodalità. Riportiamo i risultati di base su CxC per modelli unimodali e multimodali forti esistenti. Valutiamo anche un encoder dual multitask addestrato sia sulle coppie immagine-didascalia che didascalia-didascalia che dimostra in modo cruciale il valore di CxC per misurare l'influenza dell'apprendimento intra-e intermodale.", 'kk': 'Көптеген модельді алу және оқытуды қолдау арқылы кескін айдарындағы деректер жиындары көрсетілетін оқыту үшін белгілі жұмыс істейді. Кешіріңіз, деректер жиындарының көп модельді байланыстары шектелген: кескіндер басқа кескіндермен біріктірілмейді, айдары тек бір кескіндің басқа айдарының біріктірілмейді, негативті байланыстары жоқ және оң көп модель Бұл модельдік үйренудің ішкі ішкі тапсырмаларды қалай әсер ететін зерттеулерді бақылайды. Біз бұл кеңістікті Крискросс айдарлары (CxC) мен, көмегімен 267 095 ішкі және ішкі моделиттік қорлары үшін MS- COCO деректер қорларының кеңістігін қолданамыз. Біз CxC негізгі негізгі нәтижелерді бір модель және көп модель үлгілері үшін хабарлаймыз. Біз сондай-ақ кескін айдары мен айдарының екеуінде оқылған көптеген екі тапсырма кодерін бағалаймыз. Бұл CxC интернет- және медициналық оқыту үшін көпшілікті оқыту үшін мәнін көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Dengan menyokong latihan dan penilaian pemulihan berbilang-modal, set data captioning imej telah mendorong kemajuan yang luar biasa dalam pembelajaran perwakilan. Malangnya, set data mempunyai kumpulan melintasi-modal terbatas: imej tidak dipasang dengan imej lain, tajuk hanya dipasang dengan tajuk lain imej yang sama, tiada kumpulan negatif dan hilang kumpulan melintasi-modal positif. Ini merusak kajian bagaimana pembelajaran antarmodalitas mempengaruhi tugas intra-modaliti. Kami mengatasi ruang ini dengan Capsi Crisscrossed (CxC), sambungan set data MS-COCO dengan penilaian semantik persamaan manusia untuk 267,095 pasangan intra- dan intermodaliti. We report baseline results on CxC for strong existing unimodal and multimodal models.  Kami juga menilai pengekod dua tugas berbilang yang dilatih pada pasangan imej-caption dan caption-caption yang paling penting menunjukkan nilai CxC untuk mengukur pengaruh pembelajaran intra- dan intermodaliti.', 'mk': "Со поддршката на мултимодалната обука и евалуација за преземање на слики, наборите на податоци за наслови на сликите поттикнаа извонреден напредок во учењето на претставништвото. За жал, датотеките имаат ограничени крстомодални асоцијации: сликите не се парирани со други слики, насловите се парирани само со други наслови на истата слика, нема негативни асоцијации и недостасуваат позитивни крстомодални асоцијации. Ова го поткопува истражувањето за тоа како интермодијалното учење влијае на интермодијалните задачи. Ние ја решаваме оваа празнина со Crisscrossed Captions (CxC), продолжување на податоците на MS-COCO со човечки семантични пресуди за сличност за 267.095 интермодитални и меѓумодитални парови. Ние известуваме за основните резултати на CxC за силни постоечки унимодални и мултимодални модели. We also evaluate a multitask dual encoder trained on both image-caption and caption-caption pairs that crucially demonstrates CxC's value for measuring the influence of intra- and inter-modality learning.", 'mt': "By supporting multi-modal retrieval training and evaluation, image captioning datasets have spurred remarkable progress on representation learning.  Sfortunatament, is-settijiet tad-dejta għandhom assoċjazzjonijiet transmodali limitati: l-immaġni mhumiex imqabbla ma’ immaġni oħra, il-intestaturi huma mqabbla biss ma’ intestaturi oħra tal-istess immaġni, ma hemm l-ebda assoċjazzjonijiet negattivi u hemm nuqqas ta’ assoċjazzjonijiet transmodali pożittivi. Dan jimmina r-riċerka dwar kif it-tagħlim inter-modalità għandu impatt fuq il-kompiti intramodali. Aħna nindirizzaw din id-distakk mal-Kapitoli Crisscrossed (CxC), estensjoni tad-dataset MS-COCO b’sentenzi semantiċi ta’ similarità umana għal 267,095 par intra- u inter-modality. Aħna nirrappurtaw ir-riżultati tal-linja bażi dwar CxC għal mudelli unimodali u multimodali eżistenti b’saħħithom. Aħna jevalwaw ukoll kodifikatur doppju multikompiti mħarreġ kemm fuq par ta' immaġni-titolu kif ukoll titolu-titolu li juri b'mod kruċjali l-valur ta' CxC għall-kejl tal-influwenza tat-tagħlim intra-modali u intermodali.", 'ml': 'പല-മോഡാല്\u200d പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നതിനെയും പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നതിനെയും പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, ഇമേജ് ക്യാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d ഡ നിര്\u200dഭാഗ്യവശാല്\u200d, ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d ക്രോസ്മോഡല്\u200d സംഘടികള്\u200d പരിധിയിലാണ്: ചിത്രങ്ങള്\u200d മറ്റു ചിത്രങ്ങളോടൊപ്പം ഇണക്കുന്നില്ല, ശേഖരങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരേ ചിത്രത്തിന്റ ഇത് വിദ്യാഭ്യാസ പഠിക്കുന്നത് എങ്ങനെയാണെന്ന് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു ക്രിസ്ക്രോസ്സ് ക്രോസ്സ് ക്രോസ് ക്രോസ് ക്രോപ്സ് തപ്പുകളുമായി ഈ വ്യത്യാസം വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. MS-CO ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിന്റെ വിശേഷവും, മനുഷ്യന്\u200d  We report baseline results on CxC for strong existing unimodal and multimodal models.  ചിത്രത്തിന്റെ തലക്കെട്ടിന്റെയും തലക്കെട്ടിന്റെയും ജോട്ടില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു മുള്\u200dട്ടിട്ടിക്കൂട്ടിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു രണ്ട് കോഡ', 'lt': 'Remiant daugiarūšio naudojimo mokymus ir vertinimą, vaizdo įrašų duomenų rinkiniai paskatino pastebimą pažangą atstovavimo mokymosi srityje. Deja, duomenų rinkiniai turi ribotas tarpmodalines asociacijas: vaizdai nesuderinami su kitais vaizdais, antraštės susiejamos tik su kitais to paties vaizdo antraštėmis, nėra neigiamų asociacijų ir trūksta teigiamų tarpmodalinių asociacijų. This undermines research into how inter-modality learning impacts intra-modality tasks.  We address this gap with Crisscrossed Captions (CxC), an extension of the MS-COCO dataset with human semantic similarity judgments for 267,095 intra- and inter-modality pairs.  We report baseline results on CxC for strong existing unimodal and multimodal models.  Taip pat vertiname daugelį užduočių atliekantį dvigubą kodatorių, apmokytą tiek vaizdo, tiek antraštinės dalies ir antraštinės dalies poromis, kuris iš esmės parodo CxC vertę vertinant mokymosi būdų viduje ir tarpusavio mokymosi įtaką.', 'mn': 'Ихэнх моделийн аврах сургалтыг дэмжиж, үнэлгээ дэмжиж, зурагт хэвлэх өгөгдлийн сангууд нь үзүүлэх сургалтын тухай гайхалтай хөгжлийг дэмжиж байна. Харамсалтай нь, өгөгдлийн сангууд өөр зурагтай холбогдож байдаг: зураг нь өөр зурагтай холбогдож байхгүй, зураг нь зөвхөн ижил зурагтай холбогдож байдаг, сөрөг холбогдол байхгүй, эерэг хэлбэртэй холбогдол байхгүй. Энэ нь зан чанарын суралцах үйл ажиллагаанд хэрхэн нөлөөлдөг талаар судалгааг бууруулдаг. Бид үүнийг Crisscrossed Captions (CxC), MS-COCO өгөгдлийн санг хүн төрөлхтний зэрэгцээ ижил хэмжээний 267,095 интро-болон интромодал хоёрын хувьд нэмэгдүүлэхэд тусалдаг. Бид CxC-ын үндсэн үр дүнг суурилсан нэг болон олон моделийн загваруудын тулд мэдээлэл өгдөг. Мөн бид олон ажлын хоёр давхар коддогчийг дүгнэж байгаа зураг, дуудлага хэвлэлийн хоёр давхар, CxC-ын үнэ цэнийг интро болон интровертийн суралцааны нөлөөлөлийг хэмжихэд үзүүлдэг.', 'sr': 'Podržavajući multimodalnu obuku povratka i procjenu, kompleta podataka za snimanje slika izazvala je izuzetan napredak na učenje predstavljanja. Nažalost, podaci imaju ograničene krsnomodalne asocijacije: slike nisu povezani sa drugim slikama, naslovi su povezani samo sa drugim naslovima iste slike, nema negativnih asocijacija i nedostaju pozitivne krsnomodalne asocijacije. To potakne istraživanje o tome kako međumodalno učenje utiče na zadatak unutar modaliteta. Rešavamo taj praznik sa kapcima Crisscrossed (CxC), produženjem kompleta podataka MS-COCO sa osuđivanjima ljudske semantičke sličnosti za 267.095 unutrašnjih i međumodalnih parova. Prijavljamo početne rezultate CxC za jake postojeće unimodalne i multimodalne modele. Takođe procjenjujemo dvostruki koder koji je obučen i na parovima slike i kapcije, koji su ključno pokazivali vrijednost CxC-a za mjerenje utjecaja učenja unutar i međumodaliteta.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් මොඩාල් ප්\u200dරධානය සහ විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා පින්තූර ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා පින්තූර ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා පින්තූර ප්\u200dරධ අවාසනාවෙන්න, දත්ත සැට් සම්බන්ධ විශේෂයක් තියෙනවා: පින්තූරය අනිත් පින්තූරය සමග සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ නැහැ, පින්තූරය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න මේක පරීක්ෂණය අඩුවෙනවා කොහොමද අන්තර්භාවිතාවක් ඉගෙන ගන්නේ කියලා, අන්තර්භාවිතාවක් වැඩේ අ අපි මේක ක්\u200dරිස්ක්\u200dරොස් කැප්ටන්ස් සමග මෙහෙයුම් කරනවා, MS-COCO දත්ත සැකසුම් සමග මිනිස්සුන්ගේ සැමැන්තික සමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරන්න 267,325 intra- සහ අ අපි CxC වලට ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙන්නේ බලපොරොත්තු නිමෝඩාල් සහ ගොඩක් මෝඩේල් වලට. අපි වගේම ගොඩක් වැඩි කාර්යයක් අවශ්\u200dය කරනවා දුවන් කේප්ටර් එක්ක සහ පින්තූරණය සහ පින්තූර-කේප්ටර් එක්ක දෙන්නම් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන්න', 'pl': 'Dzięki wspieraniu szkoleń i oceny multimodalnego odzyskiwania zbiorów danych dotyczących napisów zdjęć przyczyniły się do niezwykłego postępu w nauce reprezentacji. Niestety zbiory danych mają ograniczone skojarzenia crossmodalne: obrazy nie są sparowane z innymi obrazami, podpisy są sparowane tylko z innymi podpisami tego samego obrazu, nie ma negatywnych skojarzeń i brakuje pozytywnych skojarzeń crossmodalnych. Podważa to badania nad tym, w jaki sposób uczenie się intermodalne wpływa na zadania intermodalne. Rozwiązujemy tę lukę za pomocą Crisscross Captions (CxC), rozszerzenia zbioru danych MS-COCO o ludzkie oceny podobieństwa semantycznego dla par wewnątrz- i intermodalnych 267,095. Raportujemy wyniki bazowe dotyczące CxC dla silnych istniejących modeli unimodalnych i multimodalnych. Oceniamy również wielozadaniowy podwójny koder przeszkolony zarówno na parach obrazu-podpisu, jak i napisu-podpisu, który istotnie demonstruje wartość CxC w mierzeniu wpływu uczenia się wewnątrz- i intermodalnego.', 'no': 'Med å støtte fleire modal opplæring og evaluering, har biletetatassett ført til merkelige framgang ved å lære representasjonar. Dessverre har datasett begrenset krysmodale tilknytingar: bilete er ikkje saman med andre bilete, tittel er berre saman med andre tittel av det same biletet, det finst ingen negativ tilknytingar og det manglar positiv krysmodale tilknytingar. Dette understrekar forskning på korleis læring av intermodalitet påvirkar inni modalitetsoppgåver. Vi adresserer dette mellomrommet med Crisscrossed Captions (CxC), eit utviding av MS-COCO-dataset med menneskelsemantiske sprøytebruk for 267,095 intra- og mellommodalitetspar. Vi rapporterer baseline resultat på CxC for sterke unimodal og multimodal modeller som finst. Vi evaluerer også ein fleire oppgåver dual koder som treng på både biletet- tittel og tittel- par som viser CxC- verdien for å måle effekten av læring av intra- og mellommodalitet.', 'ro': 'Prin sprijinirea formării și evaluării multimodale de recuperare, seturile de date privind subtitrarea imaginilor au stimulat progrese remarcabile în învățarea reprezentării. Din păcate, seturile de date au asocieri cross-modale limitate: imaginile nu sunt asociate cu alte imagini, subtitrările sunt asociate doar cu alte subtitrări ale aceleiași imagini, nu există asocieri negative și lipsesc asocieri cross-modale pozitive. Acest lucru subminează cercetarea privind impactul învățării intermodale asupra sarcinilor intramodale. Abordăm acest decalaj cu Crisscrossed Captions (CxC), o extensie a setului de date MS-COCO cu judecăți de similitudine semantică umană pentru 267.095 perechi intra- și intermodalitate. Raportăm rezultatele referitoare la CxC pentru modele unimodale și multimodale puternice existente. Evaluăm, de asemenea, un encoder dual multitask instruit atât pe perechile imagine-captare, cât și pe perechile captare-captare, care demonstrează esențial valoarea CxC pentru măsurarea influenței învățării intra-și intermodale.', 'so': 'Kaalmeynta waxbarashada dib u qaadashada iyo qiimeynta, sawirka la qabsashada macluumaadka waxaa soo baxay horumar la yaab leh oo ku saabsan waxbarashada la barto. Unfortunately, datasets have limited cross-modal associations: images are not paired with other images, captions are only paired with other captions of the same image, there are no negative associations and there are missing positive cross-modal associations.  Waxbarashadan waxaa hoos looga baaraandegayaa sida waxbarashada hab-dhexe ay u saameyso shaqada qaabka ah. Waxaannu ka sheekeysanaynaa goobahan Crisscross Captions (CxC), extension of the MS-CO dataset with humane semantic similarity for 267,095 intra- and inter-modality pairs. Waxaan wargelinaynaa resultiyada aasaasiga ah ee CxC ku saabsan tusaalooyin aad u xoog badan oo ay ku jiraan noocyo badan. Sidoo kale waxaynu qiimeynaynaa qodobka labada qodob ee loo baray sawirka iyo labada nooc oo ay si muhiim ah u muujiyaan qiimaha CxC si loo qiyaaso saameynta barashada xilliga iyo barashada xilliga dhexe.', 'ta': 'பல- மாற்று மீட்டெடுப்பு பயிற்சி மற்றும் மதிப்பீட்டை ஆதரிக்கையால், பிம்பம் பிடிப்பு தகவல் பெறுதல் தகவல் அமைப்புகள் பிரத துரதிர்ஷ்டவசமாக, தகவல் அமைப்புகள் கிடைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது: பிம்பங்கள் மற்ற படங்களுடன் இணைக்கப்படவில்லை, தலைப்புகள் மட்டும் ஒரே பிம்பத்தின் மற்ற தலைப்புகளுடன் ஜோ இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியை குறைவாக்குகிறது இடைமுறையில் கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் வகையில் உள்ள முறைமையான பணிகளை எவ்வா @ info நாம் அடிப்படைக்கோடு முடிவு பிம்பத்தின் தலைப்புகள் மற்றும் தலைப்புகள் ஜோடியிலும் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட பல்திருக்கும் இரட்டை குறியீட்டை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம். இது CxC விளைவு', 'sv': 'Genom att stﾃｶdja multimodal hﾃ､mtning utbildning och utvﾃ､rdering har bildtextningsdatauppsﾃ､ttningar sporrat anmﾃ､rkningsvﾃ､rda framsteg nﾃ､r det gﾃ､ller representationsinlﾃ､rning. Tyvﾃ､rr har datauppsﾃ､ttningar begrﾃ､nsade tvﾃ､rmodala associationer: bilder paras inte ihop med andra bilder, bildtexter paras bara ihop med andra bildtexter av samma bild, det finns inga negativa associationer och det saknas positiva tvﾃ､rmodala associationer. Detta undergrﾃ､ver forskningen om hur intermodalt lﾃ､rande pﾃ･verkar intramodalitetsuppgifter. Vi tar itu med detta gap med Crisscrossed Captions (CxC), en fﾃｶrlﾃ､ngning av MS-COCO datauppsﾃ､ttningen med mﾃ､nskliga semantiska likheter bedﾃｶmningar fﾃｶr 267 095 intra- och intermodalitetspar. Vi rapporterar basresultat pﾃ･ CxC fﾃｶr starka befintliga unimodala och multimodala modeller. Vi utvﾃ､rderar ocksﾃ･ en multitask dual encoder utbildad pﾃ･ bﾃ･de bild-bildtext och bildtext-bildtext par som avgﾃｶrande visar CxC:s vﾃ､rde fﾃｶr att mﾃ､ta pﾃ･verkan av intra- och intermodalitetslﾃ､rande.', 'ur': 'بہت سی موڈال پھیرنے کی تعلیم اور ارزیابی کی مدد کے ذریعہ، تصویر کاپٹینگ ڈیٹ سٹ کے ذریعہ نمایش کی تعلیم کے بارے میں بہت اچھا پیشرفت ہے. بدبختی ہے، ڈاٹ سٹ کے لئے مقدار کرس موڈال اتصال ہیں: تصاویر دوسرے تصاویروں کے ساتھ جوڑ نہیں ہوتے، کپٹ صرف ایک تصویر کے دوسرے کپٹ کے ساتھ جوڑ کئے جاتے ہیں، کوئی منفی اتصال نہیں ہے اور کوئی مثبت کرس موڈال اتصال نہیں ہوتے۔ یہ تحقیقات کے ذریعہ تحقیقات کو کمزور کرتا ہے کہ درمیان موڈلی تعلیم کس طرح موڈلی کے کاموں پر اثر دیتا ہے۔ ہم اس فاصلہ کو کریسسکروس کی کاپیشن (CxC) کے ساتھ سمجھتے ہیں، ایک مئس-COCO ڈیٹ سٹ کے مطابق 267,095 داخل اور درمیان موڈلیٹی جوڑوں کے ساتھ انسان کی سیمانٹی برابری کا فیصلہ کرنا ہے. ہم CxC پر بنیاس لین نتائج راپورٹ کر رہے ہیں مضبوط موجود غیر موڈال اور متعدم موڈل موڈل کے لئے۔ ہم نے بھی ایک multitask دوئل کوڈر کا ارزش کیا ہے جو تصویر-کپشن اور کپشن-کپشن جوڑوں پر آموزش کی جاتی ہے جو CxC کے ارزش کو دکھاتا ہے کہ اس کے اندر اور درمیان موڈلیت کی تعلیم کے مطابق اندازے کے لئے۔', 'vi': 'Bằng cách hỗ trợ đào tạo và đánh giá nhiều phương tiện khác nhau, chương trình đánh giá ảnh đã thúc đẩy một tiến bộ đáng chú ý về học quyền đại diện. Không may, các tập tin có giới hạn các cách mạng: hình ảnh không kết hợp với các ảnh khác, hình ảnh chỉ kết hợp với các chỉ dẫn khác của cùng một hình ảnh, không có liên quan tiêu cực nào và thiếu các liên quan tiêu biểu tích cực. Việc này ảnh hưởng đến cách học nội động. Chúng ta giải quyết vấn đề này bằng các Bắt tại giải mã, một phần mở rộng dữ liệu của xơ rải rác CO với tỉ lệ giống nhau cơ bản chung với giá 27,095 phân loại và liên cách. Chúng tôi báo cáo kết quả sơ bộ về CxC cho những mô- đun và đa phương. Chúng tôi cũng đánh giá một bộ mã hóa kép đa nhiệm được huấn luyện về cả hai cặp chụp ảnh và chụp ảnh mà cho thấy giá trị của C5C với việc đo lường ảnh hưởng của học tập nội giao và nội giao.', 'uz': "Koʻproq modulni olib tashlash va qiymatni qoʻllashda, rasm olish va maʼlumot etish tugmasini taʼminlashda ajoyib muvaffaqiyatsiz qoʻlladi. Uzunasiz, maʼlumotlar tarkibi boshqa modal aloqalarida chegara boʻlgan. Rasmlar boshqa rasmlar bilan bir xil boʻlmaydi, sarlavhaslar faqat bitta rasmning boshqa sarlavhasi bilan bir nechta boʻlmaydi, negativ bogʻliqlar mavjud emas va joylashtirish usuli yoʻq. Bu o'rganishni o'rganishning har xil usuli vazifalarini qanday qilishini yaratadi. @ info Biz muvaffaqiyatli unimodal va multimodal modellari uchun CxC asosiy natijalari haqida xabar beramiz. Biz sur'ning sarlavhasi va sarlavhasining ikki marta o'rganilgan multitask kodlash qoidasini qiymatimiz. Bu yerda CxC qiymatini ko'rsatadi.", 'nl': 'Door multimodale retrieval training en evaluatie te ondersteunen, hebben beeldbijschriftdatasets opmerkelijke vooruitgang op het gebied van representatie learning gestimuleerd. Helaas hebben datasets beperkte crossmodale associaties: afbeeldingen worden niet gekoppeld aan andere afbeeldingen, bijschriften worden alleen gekoppeld aan andere bijschriften van dezelfde afbeelding, er zijn geen negatieve associaties en er ontbreken positieve crossmodale associaties. Dit ondermijnt het onderzoek naar de invloed van intermodaal leren op intramodale taken. We verhelpen deze kloof met Crisscrossed Captions (CxC), een uitbreiding van de MS-COCO dataset met humane semantische vergelijkingsoordelen voor 267,095 intra- en intermodaliteitsparen. We rapporteren baseline resultaten op CxC voor sterke bestaande unimodale en multimodale modellen. We evalueren ook een multitask dual encoder die getraind is op zowel beeld-bijschrift als bijschrift-bijschrift paren die de waarde van CxC voor het meten van de invloed van intra- en intermodaliteit leren cruciaal aantoont.', 'bg': 'Подкрепяйки обучението и оценката за мултимодално извличане, наборите от данни за надписи на изображения стимулират забележителен напредък в обучението за представяне. За съжаление, наборите от данни имат ограничени междумодални асоциации: изображенията не са сдвоени с други изображения, надписите се сдвояват само с други надписи на едно и също изображение, няма отрицателни асоциации и липсват положителни междумодални асоциации. Това подкопава изследванията за това как интермодалното обучение оказва влияние върху задачите в рамките на модалността. Ние разглеждаме тази празнота с Крискросed Captions (CxC), разширение на набор от данни MS-COCO с преценки за човешка семантична прилика за 267 095 интрамодални и интермодални двойки. Докладваме базови резултати за СхС за силни съществуващи унимодални и мултимодални модели. Също така оценяваме многозадачен двоен кодер, обучен както върху двойки изображение-надпис, така и върху надпис-надпис, който демонстрира съществено стойността на CxC за измерване на влиянието на интрамодалното и интермодалното обучение.', 'id': 'Dengan mendukung pelatihan dan evaluasi retrieval multi modal, set data captioning gambar telah mendorong kemajuan yang luar biasa dalam pembelajaran representation. Sayangnya, dataset memiliki asosiasi transmodal terbatas: gambar tidak berpasangan dengan gambar lain, captions hanya berpasangan dengan captions lain dari gambar yang sama, tidak ada asosiasi negatif dan tidak ada asosiasi transmodal positif. Ini merusak penelitian bagaimana intermodalitas belajar mempengaruhi tugas intramodalitas. Kami mengatasi ruang ini dengan Crisscrossed Captions (CxC), sebuah ekstensi dari dataset MS-COCO dengan penghakiman semantis persamaan manusia untuk 267.095 pasangan intra- dan intermodalitas. Kami melaporkan hasil dasar pada CxC untuk model unimodal dan multimodal yang kuat. Kami juga mengevaluasi koder dual multitask yang dilatih pada pasangan image-caption dan caption-caption yang paling penting menunjukkan nilai CxC untuk mengukur pengaruh belajar intra- dan intermodalitas.', 'de': 'Durch die Unterst체tzung multimodaler Retrieval-Schulungen und -Evaluierungen haben Bildunterschriftsdatens채tze bemerkenswerte Fortschritte beim Lernen von Repr채sentationen angeregt. Leider haben Datens채tze begrenzte crossmodale Assoziationen: Bilder werden nicht mit anderen Bildern gepaart, Beschriftungen werden nur mit anderen Beschriftungen des gleichen Bildes gepaart, es gibt keine negativen Assoziationen und es fehlen positive crossmodale Assoziationen. Dies untergr채bt die Erforschung, wie sich intermodales Lernen auf intramodale Aufgaben auswirkt. Wir schlie횩en diese L체cke mit Crisscrossed Captions (CxC), einer Erweiterung des MS-COCO Datensatzes mit humanen semantischen 횆hnlichkeitsurteilen f체r 267,095 intra- und intermodale Paare. Wir berichten Baseline-Ergebnisse zu CxC f체r starke bestehende unimodale und multimodale Modelle. Wir evaluieren auch einen Multitask-Dual-Encoder, der sowohl f체r Bild-Untertitel- als auch f체r Untertitel-Untertitel-Paare trainiert ist, der den Wert von CxC f체r die Messung des Einflusses von intra- und intermodalem Lernen entscheidend demonstriert.', 'da': "Ved at understøtte multimodal træning og evaluering har datasæt med billedtekster fremmet bemærkelsesværdige fremskridt med repræsentationslæring. Desværre har datasæt begrænsede tværmodale associationer: Billeder parres ikke med andre billeder, billedtekster parres kun med andre billedtekster af det samme billede, der er ingen negative associationer, og der mangler positive tværmodale associationer. Dette underminerer forskningen i, hvordan intermodal læring påvirker intramodalitetsopgaver. Vi løser dette hul med Crisscrossed Captions (CxC), en udvidelse af MS-COCO datasættet med menneskelige semantiske lighedsvurderinger for 267.095 intra- og intermodalitetspar. Vi rapporterer baseline resultater på CxC for stærke eksisterende unimodale og multimodale modeller. Vi evaluerer også en multi-task dual encoder trænet på både billede-billedtekst og billedtekst-billedtekst par, der afgørende demonstrerer CxC's værdi for at måle indflydelsen af intra- og intermodalitet læring.", 'hr': 'Podržavajući višemodalnu obuku i procjenu povratka, podaci podataka za snimanje slika izazvali su izuzetan napredak na učenju predstavljanja. Nažalost, podaci imaju ograničene krsnomodalne asocijacije: slike se ne povezuju s drugim slikama, naslovi se povezuju samo sa drugim naslovima iste slike, nema negativnih asocijacija i nedostaju pozitivne krsnomodalne asocijacije. To potiče istraživanje o tome kako međumodalno učenje utječe na zadatke unutar modaliteta. Ovaj prasak se obrađujemo s kapcima Crisscrossed (CxC), produženjem kompleta podataka MS-COCO-a s osuđivanjima ljudske semantičke sličnosti za 267.095 unutar i međumodalnih parova. Prijavljujemo početne rezultate CxC za jake postojeće unimodalne i multimodalne modele. Također procjenjujemo dvostruki koder koji je obučen na parovima slike i kapcije, koji su ključno pokazivali vrijednost CxC-a za mjerenje utjecaja učenja unutar i međumodaliteta.', 'fa': 'با پشتیبانی آموزش و ارزیابی بسیاری از مدل\u200cها، مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای عنوان تصویر، پیشرفت فوق\u200cالعاده در مورد یادگیری نمایش\u200cدهندگان را پیشنهاد داده است. متاسفانه، مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها ارتباط\u200cهای متفاوتی محدود دارند: تصویر با تصویر دیگر جفت نمی\u200cشوند، عنوان فقط با عنوان دیگر از یک تصویر جفت می\u200cشوند، ارتباط منفی وجود ندارد و ارتباط\u200cهای متفاوتی مثبت وجود ندارد. این تحقیقات درباره اینکه یادگیری بین\u200cmodalities چگونه بر وظیفه\u200cهای بین\u200cmodalities اثر می\u200cدهد. ما این فاصله را با کاپیتان\u200cهای کریسسکروس (CxC) دریافت می\u200cکنیم، وسیله\u200cای از مجموعه داده\u200cهای MS-COCO با قضاوت\u200cهای شبیه\u200cانگیز انسان برای جفت\u200cهای ۲۶۷،095 درون و بین\u200cاندازی. ما نتیجه\u200cهای پایه\u200cخط بر CxC گزارش می\u200cکنیم برای مدل\u200cهای بی\u200cmodal و multimodal قوی وجود دارد. ما همچنین یک قالب دوگانه\u200cی چندین کار را ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم که روی جفت\u200cهای عنوان تصویر و عنوان عنوان عنوان عنوان تصویر آموزش یافته شده است که به طور کلی ارزش CxC را برای اندازه\u200cگیری تاثیر یادگیری داخل و متوسط موادی نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'af': "Deur te ondersteun multimodaal ontvang onderwerking en evaluering, het beeldtitelsette datastelle betekende vordering gevra op voorstelling leer. Ongelukkig, datastelle het beperk kruismodale assosiasies: beelde word nie paired met ander beelde nie, titels word slegs paired met ander titels van dieselfde beeld, daar is geen negatiewe assosiasies en daar is ontbreek positiewe kruismodale assosiasies. Hierdie onderwerp onderwerp onder die onderwerp na hoe intermodaliteit leer invloek intra-modaliteit-opdragte. Ons adres hierdie gap met Crisscrossed Captions (CxC), â\x80\x99n uitbreiding van die MS- COCO datastel met menslike semantiese gelykenis oordelings vir 267,095 intra- en intermodaliteit paar. Ons rapporteer basisline resultate op CxC vir sterk bestaande unimodale en multimodale modele. Ons evalueer ook 'n veelvuldige taak tweede enkoder wat op beeld-titel en caption-caption-paire opgelei is wat kruistelik CxC se waarde wys om die influens van intra- en intermodaliteit-leer te maak.", 'tr': "Çoklu modal gaýd etmek we deňlenmek üçin resim küpşenleri taýýarlamak üçin aýratyn öwrenmek üçin aýratyn ösümligi bellendirdi. Gynansakda, veri düzümleri çykaryp modal baglaýyşlar bardyr: suratlar başga suratlar bilen baglanmaýar, käpşenler diňe ayn suratyň başga käpşenleri bilen baglanmaýar, hiç hili täsir baglaýyşlar ýok we ymyk modal baglaýyşlar ýok. Bu modalitet öwrenmeniň modalitet zadynyň içine nähili täsiri täsirini azaltýar. Biz bu gaplary Crisscrossed Captions (CxC) ile çözeriz, MS-COCO veri setiniň 267,095 intra- we modalitet çiftleri üçin bir döwletlere golaýlaşýarys. Biz bu ýerde bolan unimodal we multimodal nusgalar üçin CxC barada esasy netijeleri baglaýarys. Biz hem surat-başlığı hem de kelime-başlığı üzerinde eğitilen bir çoklu işaretli çizgini değerlendiriyoruz. Bu şekilde CxC'nin intra ve modalitet öğrenmesinin etkisini ölçüde değerlendirmek üçin önemli bir şekilde gösteriyor.", 'sq': "Duke mbështetur trajnimin dhe vlerësimin e tërheqjes multimodale, grupet e të dhënave të titullimit të imazheve kanë nxitur përparim të shquar në mësimin e përfaqësimit. Fatkeqësisht, grupet e të dhënave kanë shoqata të kufizuara ndërmodali: imazhet nuk janë të barabarta me imazhe të tjera, titujt janë të barabarta vetëm me titujt e tjerë të të njëjtit imazh, nuk ka shoqata negative dhe mungon shoqata pozitive ndërmodali. Kjo dëmton kërkimin se si mësimi ndërmodalitet ndikon në detyrat brenda modalitetit. Ne e trajtojmë këtë boshllëk me Captions Crisscrossed (CxC), një zgjerim të dataset MS-COCO me gjykime njerëzore semantike të ngjashmërisë për 267,095 çifte brenda dhe ndërmodaliteti. Ne raportojmë rezultatet bazë në CxC për modele të forta ekzistuese unimodale dhe multimodale. We also evaluate a multitask dual encoder trained on both image-caption and caption-caption pairs that crucially demonstrates CxC's value for measuring the influence of intra- and inter-modality learning.", 'am': 'በብዙ-modal ማስተማር እና ማስታወቂያውን በመደጋገም ምስል ማቀናጃ የዳታ ማቀናጃ ማስታወቂያውን በመግለጥ የሚያስደንቅ ግንኙነት አግኝቷል፡፡ በመከፋት፣ የዳታ ሰርቨሮች የክፍለ ሥርዓት ማኅበረሰብ ነው፤ ምስሎች ከሌሎች ምስሎች ጋር አይጋጠሙም፣ ምርጫዎች ግን በአንድ ምስል ላይ በተለያዩ አርእስቶች ብቻ ናቸው፣ ምንም የnegative ማኅበረሰብ የለውም፣ እናም የክፍለ ሥልጣን-ሞዴል ማኅበረሰቦች አይጎድሉም፡፡ ይሄ ትምህርት በሥልጣናዊ ትምህርት እንዴት በሥርዓት ላይ የሚደርስ ነው በማድረግ ያሳድጋል፡፡ ይህንን ክፍል በክሮስcross አርእስት (CxC)፣ የMS-CO ዳታዎችን ለመዘርጋት በሰው የsemantic ብጤነት ፍርድ ለ267,095 በ.አ እና በ. የCxC ውጤቶች በጽኑ unimodal እና multimodal ሞዴል ላይ እናስባለን፡፡ የምስል አርእስት እና የCxC ዋጋውን በመለኪያ እና በሥርዓት ትምህርት ላይ በሚያስፈልገው የሁለት ብልቲካባቢ የፊደል ኮድዶችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'By supporting multi-modal retrieval training and evaluation, image captioning datasets have spurred remarkable progress on representation learning.  Դժբախտաբար, տվյալների համակարգերը սահմանափակ խաչմոդալ կապեր ունեն. պատկերները չեն զուգավորվում այլ պատկերների հետ, վերնագրերը միայն զուգավորվում են նույն պատկերի այլ վերնագրերի հետ, չկան բացասական կապեր և բացակայում են դրական խաչմոդալ կապեր: Սա նվազեցնում է հետազոտությունը, թե ինչպես է միջ-մոդեալ ուսումնասիրությունը ազդում միջ-մոդեալ խնդիրների վրա: Մենք լուծում ենք այս տարբերությունը Քրիսխրոսսփեսի (CxC) կառուցվածքների միջոցով, ՄՍ-ԿՕԿՕ տվյալների համակարգի ընդլայնումը մարդկային սեմանտիկ նմանության դատողություններով 267,085 ինտեր- և միջ-մոդեալ զույգերի համար: Մենք տեղեկացնում ենք CxC-ի հիմնական արդյունքները գոյություն ունեցող ուժեղ միամոդալ և բազմամոդալ մոդելների համար: Մենք նաև գնահատում ենք բազմախնդիրների երկու կոդեր, որը կրթություն է ստացվում և պատկերի-վերլուծության, և վերլուծության-վերլուծության զույգերի վրա, որոնք հիմնականում ցույց են տալիս CxC-ի արժեքը ինտեր- և միջ-մոդելային ուսումնասիրության ազդեցության չափման համար:', 'ko': '다중모드 검색 교육과 평가를 지원함으로써 이미지 자막 데이터 집합은 표징 학습에 현저한 진전을 거두었다.불행하게도 데이터 집합의 크로스모드 관련은 유한하다. 이미지는 다른 이미지와 어울리지 않고 자막은 같은 이미지의 다른 자막과 어울리지 않으며 부정적인 관련도 없고 긍정적인 크로스모드 관련도 부족하다.이것은 크로스모드 학습이 크로스모드 임무에 어떻게 영향을 미치는지에 대한 연구를 파괴했다.우리는 교차자막(CxC)으로 이 차이를 해결했다. 이것은 MS-COCO 데이터 집합의 확장이고 267095개의 모드 내와 모드 간에 대한 인류의 의미 유사성 판단을 가지고 있다.우리는 기존의 단봉과 다봉 모델의 CxC 기선 결과를 보고했다.우리는 또한 이미지 제목과 제목 제목이 훈련에 대한 다중 임무 듀얼 인코더를 평가했는데, 이것은 CxC가 모드와 모드 사이의 학습에 미치는 영향을 측정하는 데 있어서의 가치를 매우 중요하게 증명했다.', 'sw': 'Kwa kuunga mkono mafunzo na kutathmini mafunzo ya upatikanaji wa mitandao mbalimbali, seti za picha zinazoonyesha maendeleo mazuri kuhusu kujifunza kwa uwakilishi. Kwa bahati mbaya, seti za taarifa zimekuwa vizuizi vikubwa vya vyama vya upande: picha hazijaunganishwa na picha nyingine, vichwa vyao vinajungwa na vichwa vingine vya picha hiyo, hakuna vyama vya hasi na hakuna vyama vyenye vyama vya upande chanya. Hii inapunguza utafiti wa namna ya kujifunza kwa namna ya aina tofauti inavyoathiri kazi za utamaduni. Tunaongelea gaidi hili na vichwa vya habari vya Crisscross (CxC), kuongezeka kwa taarifa za MS-CO zenye maamuzi yanayofanana na wanadamu 267,095 kwa wanaume wa ndani na tofauti. Tunatoa taarifa za matokeo ya msingi kwenye CxC kwa mifano yenye nguvu ya kipekee na mifano mingi. Kadhalika tunatathmini kodi ya mara mbili inayofundishwa kwa picha pamoja na viwili vya vichwa vya habari ambavyo vinaonyesha thamani ya CxC kwa kupima ushawishi wa kujifunza kwa njia za ndani na kwa njia nyingine.', 'bn': 'মাল্টিমোডাল পুনরুদ্ধার প্রশিক্ষণ এবং মূল্যায়নের সমর্থন দিয়ে ছবির ক্যাপ্টেশন ডাটাসেটের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিক্ষা নিয়ে চম দুর্ভাগ্যবশত, ডাটাসেট সীমিত ক্রস-মোডাল সংস্থা: ছবিগুলো অন্যান্য ছবির সাথে জোড়া করা হয়নি, শিরোনাম শুধুমাত্র একই ছবির অন্যান্য শিরোনাম, কোন ন নেতিব কিভাবে মোডিয়াল শিক্ষা বিভিন্ন মোডিয়াল কাজের উপর প্রভাব ফেলে দেয়া হয়েছে। ক্রিস্ক্রোস ক্রোস শিরোনামের (সিক্সিসি) দ্বারা আমরা এই বিভ্রান্ত বিষয়টিকে আলোচনা করি। এমএস- কমো ডাটাসেট বিস্তারিত বিস্তারিত মানুষের সামান আমরা বেসেলাইনের ফলাফল সিক্সিতে রিপোর্ট করি বিদ্যমান ইউনিমোডাল এবং বহুটিমোডাল মডেলের জন্য। আমরা একই সাথে চিত্রের শিরোনাম এবং শিরোনামের শিরোনামের দুইবার কোডার প্রশিক্ষিত একটি মাল্টিটিক্যাডারের মূল্য মূল্য দেখাচ্ছি যা প্রকাশিত সিক্সির', 'bs': 'Podržavajući multimodalnu obuku i procjenu povratka, podaci podataka za snimanje slika izazvali su izuzetan napredak na učenju predstavljanja. Nažalost, podaci imaju ograničene krsnomodalne asocijacije: slike se ne povezuju sa drugim slikama, kapcije se povezuju samo sa drugim kapcima iste slike, nema negativnih asocijacija i nedostaju pozitivne krsnomodalne asocijacije. To podnosi istraživanje o tome kako međumodalno učenje utječe na zadatke unutar modaliteta. Mi obraćamo taj praznik sa kapcima Crisscrossed (CxC), produženjem kompleta podataka MS-COCO sa osuđivanjima ljudske semantičke sličnosti za 267.095 unutar i međumodalitetskih parova. Prijavljamo početne rezultate CxC za jake postojeće unimodalne i multimodalne modele. Također procjenjujemo dvostruki koder koji je obučen na parovima slike i kapcije, koji su ključno pokazivali vrijednost CxC-a za mjerenje utjecaja učenja unutar i međumodaliteta.', 'ca': "Sostenint formació i evaluació multimodals de recuperació, els conjunts de dades de capturació d'imatges han impulsat un progrés notable en l'aprenentatge de representació. Malauradament, els conjunts de dades tenen associacions transmodals limitades: les imatges no estan parellades amb altres imatges, els títulos només estan parellats amb altres títulos de la mateixa imatge, no hi ha associacions negatives i falten associacions transmodals positives. Això socava la recerca sobre com l'aprenentatge intermodalitat afecta les tasques intramodalitats. Afectem aquesta diferència amb Crisscrossed Captions (CxC), una extensió del conjunt de dades MS-COCO amb judicis semàntics de similitud humana per 267.095 parells intra- i inter-modalitat. Informem els resultats basals de la CxC per a models unimodals i multimodals importants. També evaluem un codificador doble multitasca entrenat en parelles imatge-títol i títol-títol que demostren crucialment el valor de CxC per mesurar l'influència de l'aprenentatge intra- i intermodalitat.", 'az': "Çoxlu modal alma təcrübəsini və değerlendirməyi dəstəkləndirək, görüntü başlıqları verilən qurğuları göstəricisi öyrənməsi barəsində möhtərəm təcrübə göstərməsini tələb etdi. Necə olaraq, veri qurğuları çox modal bağlantıları var: görüntülər başqa şəkillərlə bağlanılmaz, başlıqlar yalnız aynı suretin başqa başlıqları ilə bağlanılır, negatif bağlantılar yoxdur və pozitif çox modal bağlantılar yoxdur. Bu, modaliyyət öyrənməsinin modaliyyət işlərinin necə etkisi olduğunu araştırmağı zəifləyir. Biz bu boşluğu Crisscrossed Captions (CxC) ilə çəkirik, MS-COCO veri qutusu 267,095 intra-modalitet çiftləri üçün insan semantik bənzər hökmləri ilə uzaqlaşdırılır. Biz CxC ilə əsas səhifələrin sonuçlarını çox modal və çox modal modellər üçün xəbər veririk. Biz həmçinin CxC'nin qiymətini intra-modalitat öyrənməsinin təsirini ölçüyə görə bilinmiş çoxlu işin dual kodlayıcıs ını də təhsil edirik.", 'fi': 'Tukemalla multimodaalista hakukoulutusta ja -arviointia kuvatekstitysten aineistot ovat edistäneet huomattavaa edistystä edustuksen oppimisessa. Valitettavasti aineistoilla on rajallisia multimodaalisia yhteyksiä: kuvia ei pariteta muiden kuvien kanssa, tekstityksiä paritetaan vain saman kuvan muiden tekstitysten kanssa, negatiivisia yhteyksiä ei ole ja positiivisia multimodaalisia yhteyksiä puuttuu. Tämä heikentää tutkimusta siitä, miten intermodaalisuus-oppiminen vaikuttaa intermodaalisuuteen liittyviin tehtäviin. Korjaamme tätä aukkoa Crisscrossed Captions (CxC), MS-COCO-aineiston laajennus ihmisen semanttisen samankaltaisuuden arvioinnilla 267 095 intra- ja intermodaalisuusparille. Raportoimme CxC:n lähtötason tulokset vahvojen olemassa olevien unimodaalisten ja multimodaalisten mallien osalta. Arvioimme myös monikäyttöistä kaksoiskoodausta, joka on koulutettu sekä kuva-kuvateksti- että kuvateksti-kuvapariin, joka osoittaa ratkaisevasti CxC:n arvon intra- ja intermodaalisuuden oppimisen vaikutuksen mittaamisessa.', 'cs': 'Podporou multimodálního vyhledávání školení a vyhodnocování obrazových titulků podněcovaly pozoruhodný pokrok ve vzdělávání reprezentace. Bohužel datové sady mají omezené crossmodální asociace: obrázky nejsou spárovány s jinými obrázky, titulky jsou spárovány pouze s jinými titulky stejného obrázku, neexistují žádné negativní asociace a chybí zde kladné crossmodální asociace. To podkopává výzkum toho, jak intermodální učení ovlivňuje intramodální úkoly. Tuto mezeru řešíme pomocí Crisscrossed Titions (CxC), rozšíření MS-COCO datové sady o lidské sémantické podobnosti pro 267,095 intra- a intermodalitní páry. Podáváme základní výsledky CxC pro silné existující unimodální a multimodální modely. Vyhodnocujeme také multiúlohový duální snímač trénovaný jak na párech obrázků, tak na párech titulků, který zásadně demonstruje hodnotu CxC pro měření vlivu intra- a intermodálního učení.', 'et': 'Mitmeliigilise päringu koolituse ja hindamise toetamisega on piltide pealdiste andmekogumid andnud märkimisväärseid edusamme esindusõppes. Kahjuks on andmekogumitel piiratud modaalseid seoseid: pilte ei paarita teiste piltidega, pealdisi paaritatakse ainult teiste sama pildi pealdistega, negatiivseid seoseid puudub ja positiivseid modaalseid seoseid puudub. See õõnestab teadusuuringuid selle kohta, kuidas intermodaalne õpe mõjutab modaalsusesiseseid ülesandeid. Selle lünga lahendame Crisscrossed Captions (CxC), mis on MS-COCO andmekogumi laiendus inimese semantilise sarnasuse otsustega 267 095 modaalsusesisese ja intermodaalsuse paari kohta. Teatame CxC baastulemustest tugevate olemasolevate ühe- ja mitmeliigiliste mudelite puhul. Samuti hindame mitmeülesandelist kahekordset kodeerijat, mis on koolitatud nii pildi-pealdise kui ka pealdise-pealdise paari jaoks, mis näitab oluliselt CxC väärtust intramodaalsuse ja intermodaalsuse õppe mõju mõõtmisel.', 'sk': 'S podporo večmodalnemu usposabljanju in vrednotenju pridobivanja podatkov o napisovanju slik so nabori podatkov o napisovanju slik spodbudili izjemen napredek pri učenju reprezentacije. Na žalost imajo nabori podatkov omejene medmodalne povezave: slike niso združene z drugimi slikami, napisi so združeni samo z drugimi napisi iste slike, negativnih povezav ni in manjkajo pozitivne medmodalne povezave. To spodkopava raziskave o tem, kako intermodalno učenje vpliva na naloge znotraj modalnosti. To vrzel obravnavamo s Crisscrossed Captions (CxC), razširitvijo podatkovnega nabora MS-COCO s sodbami človeške semantične podobnosti za 267.095 intra- in intermodalnih parov. Poročamo osnovne rezultate CxC za močne obstoječe unimodalne in multimodalne modele. Ocenjujemo tudi večopravilni dvojni kodirnik, usposobljen za pare slike-napis in napis-napis, ki ključno dokazuje vrednost CxC za merjenje vpliva znotraj- in intermodalnega učenja.', 'ha': "Yi ƙarfafa da tsarin mai motsi na multi-modal, don ka sami tsarin zane da zane-zane masu motsi, sun nuna taƙaitacce mai girma a kan lõkaci na halartawa. Babu rabo, tsarin database sun ƙayyade associations masu tsohon-tsohon mutane: ba za'a haɗa zane da wasu zane ba, tsohon sunayen su sau da wasu sunayen sunayen zane da shi kawai, ba za'a sãmu da associations masu motsi kuma ba za'a sava associations masu son sura-modal. Wannan yana ƙaranci research a kan yadda learning a cikin-moda ke shagala taskõkin-moda. Tuna address wannan gap da aka yi Kriskrysset Titanin (CxC), an yalwato wa MA-CO dataset da mutane na semantic misãli wa 267,095 guda da-moda. Muna buga wani matsalar da ke ƙaranci a kan CxC wa misãlai masu ƙaranci da ke gaba da kwamfyuta masu ƙarfi. Tuna ƙaddara koden dubu wanda aka yi wa wa kodi na zane da sunan-zane da wasu mutane, da za'a nuna kimar CxC da muhimu a ƙayyade muhimmin sha'anin tsarin da za'a karanta cikin-da-kiyaye.", 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness item-set This undermines R&R&R&I;S.A.: Awak dhéwé jagat iki karo krisskros Captions Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing dadi CxC nggo gambar sistem Unimodal lan model multimodal. Awak dhéwé éntukno sistem multitask duplikasi nggawe lan sesilèh-caption lan caption-caption-caption kuwi nggawe nyimpen CxC nggawe barang nggawe gerakan kanggo mehurakno kanggo ngilanggar nggambar luwih dumateng.', 'bo': 'སྣ་མང་ཅིག་གི་ལྟ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་དང་གནད་དོན་རིམ་ལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ། གཟུགས ཡིན་ནའང་། གནད་སྡུད་གཞུང་སྒྲིག་ཚུ་ལ་ཆུང་བ་བཟོས་མེད་པ་དང་བརྙན་རིས་གཞན་དང་བསྡོམས་མེད་པ། པར་རིས་འདི་གཅིག་མཚུངས་ཀྱི་པར འདིས་གནས་ཚུལ་བྱ་རིམ་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ནང་གི་ལས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། We address this gap with Crisscrossed Captions (CxC), an extension of the MS-COCO dataset with human semantic similarity judgments for 267,095 intra- and inter-modality pairs. ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཡུལ་མྱུར་བའི་དབྱིབས་མཐུན་ཅན་དང་སྣ་མང་མཐུན་པའི་མིག་དཔེ་བྱེད་པར་གཞི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་བརྙན་རིས་དང་བགོ་བྲིས་ཁང་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་ཚད་ལ་ངེས་འཛིན་བྱེད་པའི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་ཟམ་འཛ', 'he': 'על ידי תמיכה באימונים והעריכה של השיגה המולטימודלית, קבוצות נתונים של התמונות מעוררו התקדמות מדהימה על לימוד מייצג. למרבה הצער, קבוצות נתונים יש איגודות דרך מודליות מוגבלות: תמונות לא זוויות עם תמונות אחרות, כותרות זוויות רק עם כותרות אחרות של אותה תמונה, אין איגודות שליליות ואין איגודות דרך מודליות חיוביות חסרות. This undermines research into how inter-modality learning impacts intra-modality tasks.  אנו מתמודדים עם הפער הזה עם "Crisscrossed Captions" (CxC), התאריך של קבוצת מידע MS-COCO עם שיפוטים סמנטיים של בני אדם של 267,095 זוגות בתוך ומודליות בין. אנחנו מדווחים על תוצאות בסיסית על CxC עבור דוגמנים חד-מודליים ויותרים מודליים קיימים חזקים. אנחנו גם מעריכים קודד כפול במשימות רבות מאומן על זוגות תמונה-כותר וגם כותר-כותר שמוכיחים באופן חשוב את ערכו של CxC למדוד השפעה של הלימוד בתוך ומודילי.'}
{'en': 'ENPAR : Enhancing Entity and Entity Pair Representations for Joint Entity Relation Extraction', 'ar': 'ENPAR: تعزيز تمثيل أزواج الكيانات والكيانات لاستخراج علاقة الكيان المشترك', 'pt': 'ENPAR: Aprimoramento das Representações de Entidade e Par de Entidade para Extração de Relação de Entidade Conjunta', 'fr': "ENPAR:amélioration des représentations d'entités et de paires d'entités pour l'extraction de relations entre entités conjointes", 'es': 'ENPAR:mejora de las representaciones de entidades y pares de entidades para la extracción de relaciones de entidades conjuntas', 'ja': 'ENPAR ：ジョイントエンティティ関係抽出のためのエンティティとエンティティのペア表現の強化', 'hi': 'ENPAR: संयुक्त इकाई संबंध निष्कर्षण के लिए एंटिटी और एंटिटी पेयर अभ्यावेदन बढ़ाना', 'zh': 'ENPAR曰:益之以合之,示之以体', 'ru': 'ENPAR:Улучшение представления пары сущностей и пары сущностей для экстракции отношений совместной сущности', 'ga': 'ENPAR:Uiríll Péire Aonán agus Aonáin a Fheabhsú maidir le hEasbhaint Caidrimh le hAintiteas Comhpháirteach', 'ka': 'ENPAR', 'el': 'ENPAR: Ενίσχυση των εκπροσώπων οντοτήτων και ζευγαριών οντοτήτων για την εξαγωγή κοινών σχέσεων οντοτήτων', 'hu': 'ENPAR: Az entitás- és entitáspár-képviseletek erősítése a közös entitási kapcsolat kivonásához', 'lt': 'ENPAR: Bendro subjekto santykių ekstrakcijos subjektų ir subjektų poros atstovybių stiprinimas', 'it': "ENPAR: Rafforzare le rappresentanze di coppia di entità e entità per l'estrazione di relazioni di entità congiunte", 'kk': 'ENPAR', 'mk': 'ЕНПР:Појачување на претставувањата на ентитетите и ентитетите за парови за екстракција на заедничките односи на ентитетите', 'ml': 'യൂണ്ട് എന്റിറ്റിറ്റി ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d', 'ms': 'ENPAR:Enhancing Entity and Entity Pair Representations for Joint Entity Relation Extraction', 'mn': 'ENPAR:Объект, Entity Pair Representations for Joint Entity Relation Extraction', 'no': 'ENPAR', 'mt': 'ENPAR:Titjib tar-Rappreżentanzi tal-Entità u tal-Entità għall-Pawġi għall-Estrazzjoni tar-Relazzjoni ta’ Entità Konġunta', 'pl': 'ENPAR: Zwiększenie reprezentacji podmiotów i par podmiotów dla ekstrakcji wspólnych relacji podmiotów', 'ro': 'ENPAR: Îmbunătățirea reprezentărilor perechilor de entități și entități pentru extragerea relațiilor de entitate comune', 'so': 'EENPAR: Horumarinta ganacsiga iyo mushaarka u wakiilayaasha wadajirka la xiriira ganacsiga', 'si': 'ENPAR', 'sr': 'ENPAR:Pojačavanje predstavljanja područja i područja za izvlačenje odnosa zajedničkog područja', 'sv': 'ENPAR:Förbättra representationer av enheter och enheter för extraktion av gemensamma enhetsrelationer', 'ta': 'ENPAR:Enhancing Entity and Entity Pair Representations for Joint Entity Relation Extraction', 'ur': 'انٹیٹی رابطہ نکلنے کے لئے انٹیٹی اور انٹیٹی کے جوڑے معجزات مزید کریں', 'uz': 'ENPAR:Enhancing Entity and Entity Pair Representations for Joint Entity Relation Extraction', 'vi': 'EnPARK:Sự phát triển các đơn vị và cặp đôi đủ đại diện cho Hợp chủng liên bang', 'da': 'ENPAR:Forbedring af enheds- og enhedsparrepræsentationer for udtrækning af fælles enhedsrelationer', 'bg': 'ENPAR: Повишаване на представителствата на двойката субекти и субекти за извличане на взаимоотношения със съвместни субекти', 'hr': 'ENPAR', 'nl': 'ENPAR:Versterking van vertegenwoordigingen van entiteiten en entiteiten voor gezamenlijke extractie van entiteiten', 'fa': 'ENPAR: افزایش نمایش\u200cهای جفت واحد و واحد برای استخراج ارتباط واحد متحد', 'de': 'ENPAR: Verbesserung der Vertretungen von Entitäten und Entitätenpaaren für die Extraktion von gemeinsamen Entitätenbeziehungen', 'ko': 'ENPAR: 통합 솔리드 관계 추출을 위한 솔리드 및 솔리드 쌍 표현 강화', 'id': 'ENPAR:Enhancing Entity and Entity Pair Representations for Joint Entity Relation Extraction', 'sw': 'ENPAR: Kuboresha Mazungumzo ya Ujumbe na Ujasiri kwa ajili ya Kutengwa kwa Umoja wa Mataifa', 'tr': 'ENPAR:Enhancing Entity and Entity Pair Representations for Joint Entity Relationship Extraction', 'sq': 'ENPAR:Përmirësimi i përfaqësimeve të njësisë dhe njësisë për çiftin e marrëdhënieve të përbashkëta të njësisë', 'am': 'ENPAR:Enhancing Entity and Entity Pair Representations for Joint Entity Relation Extraction', 'af': 'EnPAR:Verbeter Entiteit en Entiteit Par voorstellings vir Gesamelekte Entiteit Relasie Uitpakking', 'hy': 'ԷՆՓԱ. Միացյալ կազմակերպության հարաբերությունների արտադրման համար կազմակերպության և կազմակերպության զույգ ներկայացուցիչների բարելավումը', 'bs': 'ENPAR:Pojačavanje predstavljanja zajedničkog odnosa o području i području za izvlačenje zajedničkog područja', 'ca': 'ENPAR:Enhancing Entity and Entity Pair Representations for Joint Entity Relation Extraction', 'az': 'ENPAR', 'bn': 'এনপার: ইউনেট এন্টিটি সম্পর্ক বিনিময়ের জন্য প্রতিনিধিত্ব বৃদ্ধি করা হচ্ছে', 'cs': 'ENPAR:Posílení reprezentace entit a entity pair pro extrakci společného vztahu s entitami', 'et': 'ENPAR: Üksuste ja üksuste paari esinduste suurendamine ühiste üksuste suhete väljavõtmiseks', 'fi': 'ENPAR:Entiteettien ja yksikköparien edustustojen parantaminen yhteisyhteisöjen suhteiden purkamista varten', 'jv': 'ENPAR:', 'ha': 'Enhaning Entity and Entity Pair Repositions for Join Entity Relation Extraction', 'sk': 'ENPAR: Izboljšanje predstavništev subjektov in parov subjektov za odstranitev odnosov skupnih subjektov', 'he': 'ENPAR: שיפור ביצועים של יחסי יחסים יחסים יחסים יחסים יחסים יחסים יחסים יחסים יחסים יחסים יחסים', 'bo': 'ENPAR:Enhancing Entity and Entity Pair Representations for Joint Entity Relation Extraction'}
{'en': 'Current state-of-the-art systems for joint entity relation extraction (Luan et al., 2019 ; Wad-den et al., 2019) usually adopt the multi-task learning framework. However, annotations for these additional tasks such as coreference resolution and event extraction are always equally hard (or even harder) to obtain. In this work, we propose a pre-training method ENPAR to improve the joint extraction performance. ENPAR requires only the additional entity annotations that are much easier to collect. Unlike most existing works that only consider incorporating entity information into the sentence encoder, we further utilize the entity pair information. Specifically, we devise four novel objectives, i.e., masked entity typing, masked entity prediction, adversarial context discrimination, and permutation prediction, to pre-train an entity encoder and an entity pair encoder. Comprehensive experiments show that the proposed pre-training method achieves significant improvement over BERT on ACE05, SciERC, and NYT, and outperforms current state-of-the-art on ACE05.', 'ar': 'عادةً ما تتبنى الأنظمة الحديثة لاستخراج علاقة الكيانات المشتركة (Luan et al. ، 2019 ؛ Wad-den et al. ، 2019) إطار عمل التعلم متعدد المهام. ومع ذلك ، فإن التعليقات التوضيحية لهذه المهام الإضافية مثل دقة المرجع واستخراج الأحداث تكون دائمًا صعبة بنفس القدر (أو حتى أصعب). في هذا العمل ، نقترح طريقة ما قبل التدريب ENPAR لتحسين أداء الاستخراج المشترك. يتطلب ENPAR فقط التعليقات التوضيحية للكيانات الإضافية التي يسهل جمعها. على عكس معظم الأعمال الحالية التي تفكر فقط في دمج معلومات الكيان في مشفر الجملة ، فإننا نستخدم معلومات زوج الكيانات بشكل أكبر. على وجه التحديد ، نبتكر أربعة أهداف جديدة ، أي كتابة الكيان المقنع ، وتنبؤ الكيان المقنع ، والتمييز في سياق الخصومة ، والتنبؤ بالتبديل ، للتدريب المسبق على مشفر كيان وجهاز تشفير زوج كيان. تُظهر التجارب الشاملة أن طريقة التدريب المسبق المقترحة تحقق تحسنًا كبيرًا على BERT في ACE05 و SciERC و NYT ، وتتفوق على أحدث التقنيات الحالية في ACE05.', 'es': 'Los sistemas actuales de vanguardia para la extracción conjunta de relaciones entre entidades (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) suelen adoptar el marco de aprendizaje multitarea. Sin embargo, las anotaciones para estas tareas adicionales, como la resolución de correferencias y la extracción de eventos, siempre son igualmente difíciles (o incluso más difíciles) de obtener. En este trabajo, proponemos un método de preentrenamiento ENPAR para mejorar el rendimiento de la extracción de las articulaciones. ENPAR solo requiere las anotaciones de entidad adicionales que son mucho más fáciles de recopilar. A diferencia de la mayoría de los trabajos existentes que solo consideran la incorporación de información de entidad en el codificador de oraciones, utilizamos aún más la información de pares de entidades. Específicamente, diseñamos cuatro objetivos novedosos, es decir, la tipificación de entidades enmascaradas, la predicción de entidades enmascaradas, la discriminación de contexto contradictorio y la predicción de permutación, para preentrenar un codificador de entidad y un codificador de pares de entidades. Experimentos exhaustivos muestran que el método de preentrenamiento propuesto logra una mejora significativa con respecto al BERT en ACE05, SciERC y NYT, y supera al estado actual de vanguardia en ACE05.', 'fr': "Les systèmes actuels de pointe pour l'extraction de relations entre entités conjointes (Luan et al., 2019\xa0; WAD-den et al., 2019) adoptent généralement le cadre d'apprentissage multitâche. Cependant, les annotations pour ces tâches supplémentaires telles que la résolution de coréférence et l'extraction d'événements sont toujours aussi difficiles (voire plus difficiles) à obtenir. Dans ce travail, nous proposons une méthode de pré-entraînement ENPAR pour améliorer les performances d'extraction des articulations. ENPAR ne nécessite que les annotations d'entités supplémentaires qui sont beaucoup plus faciles à collecter. Contrairement à la plupart des œuvres existantes qui envisagent uniquement d'intégrer des informations d'entité dans l'encodeur de phrase, nous utilisons également les informations de paire d'entités. Plus précisément, nous concevons quatre nouveaux objectifs, à savoir le typage d'entité masqué, la prédiction d'entité masquée, la discrimination de contexte contradictoire et la prédiction de permutation, afin de pré-entraîner un codeur d'entité et un codeur de paire d'entités. Des expériences complètes montrent que la méthode de pré-entraînement proposée permet d'obtenir une amélioration significative par rapport au BERT sur ACE05, SciERC et NYT, et surpasse l'état actuel de la technologie sur ACE05.", 'pt': 'Os sistemas atuais de última geração para extração de relação de entidade conjunta (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) geralmente adotam a estrutura de aprendizado multitarefa. No entanto, as anotações para essas tarefas adicionais, como resolução de correferência e extração de eventos, são sempre igualmente difíceis (ou ainda mais difíceis) de obter. Neste trabalho, propomos um método de pré-treinamento ENPAR para melhorar o desempenho da extração articular. A ENPAR requer apenas as anotações de entidade adicionais que são muito mais fáceis de coletar. Ao contrário da maioria dos trabalhos existentes que consideram apenas a incorporação de informações de entidade no codificador de sentença, utilizamos ainda as informações do par de entidades. Especificamente, planejamos quatro novos objetivos, ou seja, tipagem de entidade mascarada, previsão de entidade mascarada, discriminação de contexto adversário e previsão de permutação, para pré-treinar um codificador de entidade e um codificador de par de entidades. Experimentos abrangentes mostram que o método de pré-treinamento proposto alcança uma melhoria significativa em relação ao BERT no ACE05, SciERC e NYT, e supera o atual estado da arte no ACE05.', 'ja': '共同エンティティ関係抽出のための現在の最先端のシステム（ Luan et al., 2019; Wad - den et al., 2019 ）は、通常、マルチタスク学習フレームワークを採用している。 ただし、コアリファレンス解決やイベント抽出などのこれらの追加タスクの注釈は、常に同様に入手しにくい（またはさらに難しい）。 本作では、関節抽出性能を向上させるための事前訓練方法ENPARを提案している。 ENPARは、収集がはるかに容易な追加のエンティティ注釈のみを必要とします。 エンティティ情報を文エンコーダに組み込むことのみを検討するほとんどの既存の作品とは異なり、エンティティペア情報をさらに活用しています。 具体的には、エンティティエンコーダとエンティティペアエンコーダを事前にトレーニングするために、マスキングエンティティタイプ、マスキングエンティティ予測、対立コンテキスト識別、および順列予測という4つの新規の目標を考案します。 包括的な実験では、提案された事前トレーニング方法は、ACE 05、SciERC、およびNYTでBERTよりも大幅に改善され、ACE 05で現在の最先端を凌駕していることが示されています。', 'hi': 'संयुक्त इकाई संबंध निष्कर्षण के लिए वर्तमान अत्याधुनिक प्रणालियों (लुआन एट अल। Wad-den et al., 2019) आमतौर पर बहु-कार्य सीखने के ढांचे को अपनाते हैं। हालांकि, इन अतिरिक्त कार्यों जैसे कि coreference रिज़ॉल्यूशन और ईवेंट निष्कर्षण के लिए एनोटेशन हमेशा प्राप्त करने के लिए समान रूप से कठिन (या यहां तक कि कठिन) होते हैं। इस काम में, हम संयुक्त निष्कर्षण प्रदर्शन में सुधार करने के लिए एक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण विधि ENPAR का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। ENPAR को केवल अतिरिक्त एंटिटी एनोटेशन की आवश्यकता होती है जो एकत्र करना बहुत आसान है। अधिकांश मौजूदा कार्यों के विपरीत जो केवल वाक्य एनकोडर में इकाई जानकारी को शामिल करने पर विचार करते हैं, हम आगे इकाई जोड़ी जानकारी का उपयोग करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम चार उपन्यास उद्देश्यों को तैयार करते हैं, यानी, नकाबपोश इकाई टाइपिंग, नकाबपोश इकाई भविष्यवाणी, प्रतिकूल संदर्भ भेदभाव, और क्रमपरिवर्तन भविष्यवाणी, एक इकाई एनकोडर और एक इकाई जोड़ी एन्कोडर को पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए। व्यापक प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण विधि ACE05, SciERC, और NYT पर BERT पर महत्वपूर्ण सुधार प्राप्त करती है, और ACE05 पर वर्तमान अत्याधुनिक को मात देती है।', 'zh': '今最先进者合体提取系统(Luan等,2019。 Wad-den et al., 2019)常用多任务学框架。 然于附加(如共指征解析事取)注终难(甚难)得。 于此一ENPAR预训练方法,以崇关节。 ENPAR 但须更易收注。 与大众惟思并体信息编码器中见作不同,更乘其实。 具体来说四新者,蔽实也;蔽者,对抗性上下文判也;以预训练编码器者,编码器也。 综实验表明,所陈预训练方法于ACE05、SciERC、NYT,显于BERT,优于ACE05,先进之术也。', 'ru': 'Современные системы для совместного извлечения отношений сущностей (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) обычно используют многозадачную систему обучения. Тем не менее, аннотации для этих дополнительных задач, таких как разрешение ядра и извлечение событий, всегда одинаково трудно (или даже труднее) получить. В этой работе мы предлагаем метод предварительного обучения ENPAR для улучшения показателей совместной экстракции. ENPAR требует только дополнительных аннотаций, которые гораздо проще собрать. В отличие от большинства существующих работ, в которых рассматривается только включение информации о сущности в кодировщик предложений, мы дополнительно используем информацию о паре сущностей. В частности, мы разрабатываем четыре новые цели,то есть маскированное типирование сущностей, маскированное предсказание сущностей, состязательную контекстную дискриминацию и предсказание перестановок, для предварительного обучения кодировщика сущностей и кодировщика пар сущностей. Всесторонние эксперименты показывают, что предлагаемый метод предварительного обучения достигает значительного улучшения по сравнению с BERT на ACE05, SciERC и NYT и превосходит текущее состояние на ACE05.', 'ga': 'Is gnách go nglacann córais úrscothacha reatha le haghaidh eastóscadh caidrimh chomhpháirteach (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) an creat foghlama iltascanna. Mar sin féin, bíonn sé chomh deacair (nó níos deacra fós) nótaí a fháil le haghaidh na dtascanna breise seo ar nós taifeach croí-chomhdhála agus eastóscadh imeachtaí. San obair seo, molaimid modh réamhoiliúna ENPAR chun feidhmíocht eastósctha chomhpháirteach a fheabhsú. Ní theastaíonn ach nótaí breise eintitis atá i bhfad níos éasca le bailiú ag ENPAR. Murab ionann agus formhór na n-oibreacha atá ann faoi láthair nach ndéanann ach machnamh ar fhaisnéis aonáin a ionchorprú san ionchódóir abairtí, bainimid úsáid bhreise as an bhfaisnéis péire aonáin. Go sonrach, ceapaimid ceithre chuspóir nua, i.e., clóscríobh aonáin chumhdaigh, tuar aonáin chumhdaigh, idirdhealú sáraíochta i gcomhthéacs, agus tuar iomalartaithe, chun ionchódóir aonáin agus ionchódóir péire aonáin a réamhthraenáil. Léiríonn turgnaimh chuimsitheacha go mbaineann an modh réamhoiliúna atá beartaithe feabhas suntasach amach thar BERT ar ACE05, SciERC, agus NYT, agus go n-éiríonn leis níos fearr ná an staid reatha ar ACE05.', 'hu': 'A közös entitási kapcsolatok kitermelésére szolgáló jelenlegi korszerű rendszerek (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) általában elfogadják a többfeladatos tanulási keretet. Azonban ezekhez a kiegészítő feladatokhoz, mint például a coreferencia feloldása és az események kivonása mindig ugyanolyan nehéz (vagy még nehezebb) megszerezni. Ebben a munkában egy ENPAR előképzési módszert javasolunk az ízületi extrakció teljesítményének javítására. Az ENPAR csak olyan további entitásjegyzékeket igényel, amelyek sokkal könnyebben összegyűjthetők. A legtöbb meglévő munkától eltérően, amelyek csak entitási információk beépítését fontolják a mondatkódolóba, mi tovább használjuk az entitáspár információkat. Konkrétan négy új célkitűzést dolgozunk ki, azaz maszkos entitás-gépelést, maszkos entitás-előrejelzést, ellenséges kontextus diszkriminációt és permutációs előrejelzést, hogy előkészítsünk egy entitáskódolót és egy entitáspár-kódolót. Átfogó kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt előképzési módszer jelentős javulást ér el a BERT-hez képest az ACE05, a SciERC és a New York-hez képest, és felülmúlja a jelenlegi legkorszerűbb ACE05-hez képest.', 'ka': 'მიმდინარე სისტემების შესახებ ერთადერთი ინტერტიკის შესახებ ექსტრაქციისთვის (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა მაგრამ, ამ დამატებული დავალებებისთვის მონიტოციები, როგორც წარმოადგენების განსხვავება და მოვლენების განსხვავება, ყოველთვის უფრო რთულია (ან უფრო რთულია) მიღება. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ დავიწყებთ ENPAR წინ განაკეთებული მეტი, რომელიც ერთადერთი ექსტრექციის გამოსახულება. ENPAR უნდა მხოლოდ დამატებული ინტერტიკური ანოტაციები, რომლებიც უფრო მარტივია შექმნა. მნიშვნელოვანი მუშაობის განსხვავებაზე, რომელიც მხოლოდ აღმოჩნდება ინტერტის ინფორმაციას სიტყვების კოდერში, ჩვენ მეტი ინტერტის ორი ინფორმაციას გამოყ განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ ოთხი პრომეტური მიზეზი, ანუ, მასკური ინტერტიკური წერილება, მასკური ინტერტიკური წარმოდგენა, განსაკუთრებული კონტექსკური დისკრიმინაცია და პერმუტაციის წარმოდგენა, რომ ყველაფერი ექსპერიმენტები აჩვენებენ, რომ საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი მეტი', 'el': 'Τα σημερινά συστήματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας για την εξαγωγή κοινών σχέσεων οντότητας (Λουάν κ.α., 2019, κ.α., 2019) συνήθως υιοθετούν το μαθησιακό πλαίσιο πολλαπλών εργασιών. Ωστόσο, οι σχολιασμοί για αυτές τις πρόσθετες εργασίες, όπως η ανάλυση της συνάφειας και η εξαγωγή συμβάντων, είναι πάντα εξίσου δύσκολο (ή ακόμα πιο δύσκολο) να ληφθούν. Στην εργασία αυτή, προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο προεκπαίδευσης για τη βελτίωση της απόδοσης της κοινής εξαγωγής. Το ENPAR απαιτεί μόνο τις πρόσθετες σημειώσεις οντότητας που είναι πολύ πιο εύκολο να συλλεχθούν. Σε αντίθεση με τα περισσότερα υπάρχοντα έργα που εξετάζουν μόνο την ενσωμάτωση πληροφοριών οντότητας στον κωδικοποιητή προτάσεων, χρησιμοποιούμε περαιτέρω τις πληροφορίες ζεύγους οντότητας. Συγκεκριμένα, σχεδιάζουμε τέσσερις νέους στόχους, δηλ. τον τύπο μασκοποιημένης οντότητας, την πρόβλεψη μασκοποιημένης οντότητας, την αντιδιαστατική διάκριση περιβάλλοντος και την πρόβλεψη μεταμόρφωσης, για να προετοιμάσουμε έναν κωδικοποιητή οντότητας και έναν κωδικοποιητή ζεύγους οντότητας. Ολοκληρωμένα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος προ-εκπαίδευσης επιτυγχάνει σημαντική βελτίωση έναντι του BERT σε ACE05, SciERC και NYT, και ξεπερνά την τρέχουσα κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας στο ACE05.', 'lt': 'Dabartinės naujausios bendro ūkio subjekto ryšių gavybos sistemos (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) paprastai priima daugiafunkcinio mokymosi sistemą. Tačiau pastabos dėl šių papildomų užduočių, pavyzdžiui, koreferencijos pertvarkymo ir įvykių išgavimo, visada yra tokios pat sunkios (arba net sunkiau) gauti. Šiame darbe siūlome parengiamojo mokymo metodą ENPAR siekiant pagerinti bendrą gavybos veiksmingumą. ENPAR reikalauja tik papildomų subjekto pastabų, kurias būtų daug lengviau surinkti. Unlike most existing works that only consider incorporating entity information into the sentence encoder, we further utilize the entity pair information.  Konkrečiai, parengiame keturis naujus tikslus, t. y. paslėptą subjekto rašymą, paslėptą subjekto prognozę, priešingą konteksto diskriminaciją ir permutacijos prognozę, kad parengtume subjekto koduotoją ir subjekto poros koduotoją. Išsamūs eksperimentai rodo, kad siūlomas pasirengimo mokymui metodas pasiekia reikšmingą pagerėjimą nei BERT ACE05, SciERC ir NYT srityje, o dabartiniai ACE05 rezultatai yra didesni.', 'kk': 'Қолданыстағы жалпы бірлікті бірлікті бірлікті құрылғыларды тарқату жүйелері (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) әдетте көп тапсырманың оқыту бағдарламасын қабылдайды. Бірақ, бұл қосымша тапсырмалар үшін, мысалы, керемет айырымдылығы мен оқиғаларды тарқату әрқашанда бірнеше қатты (немесе керемет қатты) болады. Бұл жұмыс ішінде ENPAR арқылы алдын- оқыту әдісін жасау үшін қолданамыз. ENPAR тек жинау үшін көп оңай болатын қосымша нысандардың жазбаларын талап етеді. Бұл жағдайдың көпшілігі тек нысандар мәліметін сұрау кодеріне енгізген жұмыстардың қасиеті болмаса, біз оның екі мәліметін қолданамыз. Сәйкес, біз төрт романдық мақсаттарды, мысалы, қалқалаған нысандарды түсіру, қалқалаған нысандарды таңдау, қарсы контексті дискриминациялау және пермутациялау таңдау үшін, нысандар кодерін және нысандардың екі кодерін алдын- ала ұқсаты Тәртіпті тәжірибелер келтірілген алдындағы оқыту әдісі ACE05, SciERC және NYT және ACE05 және қазіргі күй- жайындағы күй- жайындағы BERT жұмыс істейтінін көрсетеді.', 'it': "Gli attuali sistemi all'avanguardia per l'estrazione delle relazioni tra entità congiunte (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) di solito adottano il quadro di apprendimento multi-task. Tuttavia, le annotazioni per queste attività aggiuntive come la risoluzione della coreferenza e l'estrazione degli eventi sono sempre altrettanto difficili (o anche più difficili) da ottenere. In questo lavoro, proponiamo un metodo di pre-allenamento ENPAR per migliorare le prestazioni di estrazione articolare. ENPAR richiede solo le annotazioni aggiuntive di entità che sono molto più facili da raccogliere. A differenza della maggior parte dei lavori esistenti che considerano solo l'incorporazione delle informazioni dell'entità nel codificatore di frasi, utilizziamo ulteriormente le informazioni della coppia di entità. Nello specifico, elaboriamo quattro nuovi obiettivi, cioè la tipizzazione di entità mascherate, la previsione di entità mascherate, la discriminazione del contesto avversario e la previsione della permutazione, per pre-formare un codificatore di entità e un codificatore di coppia di entità. Esperimenti completi dimostrano che il metodo di pre-formazione proposto raggiunge un miglioramento significativo rispetto al BERT su ACE05, SciERC e NYC e supera lo stato dell'arte attuale su ACE05.", 'mk': 'Сегашните најнови системи за екстракција на заедничките односи на ентитетите (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) обично ја усвоуваат рамката за учење на мултизадачи. However, annotations for these additional tasks such as coreference resolution and event extraction are always equally hard (or even harder) to obtain.  Во оваа работа, предложуваме метод на предобука ЕНПАР за подобрување на заедничката извлекувачка резултат. ENPAR бара само дополнителни анотации на ентитетите кои се многу полесни за собирање. За разлика од повеќето постоечки дела кои размислуваат само за вклучување информации за ентитетот во кодерот на речениците, понатаму ги користиме информациите за пар ентитети. Специфично, ние создаваме четири нови цели, т.е., маскирано пишување на ентитети, маскирано предвидување на ентитетите, противна дискриминација во контекст и предвидување на пермутација, за да предобучиме кодер на ентитетите и кодер на пар ентитети. Comprehensive experiments show that the proposed pre-training method achieves significant improvement over BERT on ACE05, SciERC, and NYT, and outperforms current state-of-the-art on ACE05.', 'mt': 'Is-sistemi attwali l-aktar avvanzati għall-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet bejn entitajiet konġunti (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) normalment jadottaw il-qafas ta’ tagħlim b’diversi kompiti. Madankollu, annotazzjonijiet għal dawn il-kompiti addizzjonali bħar-riżoluzzjoni tal-koreferenza u l-estrazzjoni tal-avvenimenti huma dejjem daqstant diffiċli (jew saħansitra aktar diffiċli) biex jinkisbu. In this work, we propose a pre-training method ENPAR to improve the joint extraction performance.  L-ENPAR teħtieġ biss l-annotazzjonijiet addizzjonali tal-entità li huma ħafna aktar faċli biex jinġabru. Għall-kuntrarju tal-biċċa l-kbira tax-xogħlijiet eżistenti li jikkunsidraw biss l-inkorporazzjoni tal-informazzjoni tal-entità fil-kodifikatur tas-sentenzi, aħna qed nużaw aktar l-informazzjoni tal-par tal-entità. B’mod speċifiku, aħna niddisinjaw erba’ għanijiet ġodda, jiġifieri, it-tipografija ta’ entità mxekkla, it-tbassir ta’ entità mxekkla, id-diskriminazzjoni kontra l-kuntest, u t-tbassir tal-permutazzjoni, biex jitħarrġu minn qabel kodifikatur ta’ entità u kodifikatur ta’ par ta’ entità. Esperimenti komprensivi juru li l-metodu ta’ qabel it-taħriġ propost jikseb titjib sinifikanti fuq il-BERT fuq ACE05, SciERC, u NYT, u jaqbeż l-ogħla prestazzjoni attwali fuq ACE05.', 'ms': 'Sistem state-of-the-art semasa untuk ekstraksi hubungan entiti kongsi (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) biasanya mengadopsi kerangka pembelajaran berbilang-tugas. Namun, anotasi untuk tugas tambahan ini seperti resolusi rujukan dan ekstraksi peristiwa sentiasa sama sukar (atau lebih sukar) untuk dicapai. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan kaedah pralatihan ENPAR untuk meningkatkan prestasi ekstraksi bersama. ENPAR hanya memerlukan anotasi entiti tambahan yang jauh lebih mudah untuk dikumpulkan. Tidak seperti kebanyakan kerja yang ada yang hanya mempertimbangkan memasukkan maklumat entiti ke dalam pengekod kalimat, kami lebih lanjut menggunakan maklumat pasangan entiti. Secara khusus, kita merancang empat sasaran baru, iaitu penapisan entiti bertopeng, ramalan entiti bertopeng, diskriminasi konteks lawan, dan ramalan permutasi, untuk melatih pengekod entiti dan pengekod pasangan entiti. Eksperimen yang meliputi menunjukkan bahawa kaedah pralatihan yang diusulkan mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan atas BERT pada ACE05, SciERC, dan NYT, dan melampaui kemajuan semasa pada ACE05.', 'mn': 'Одоогоор нийгмийн нэгж хамааралтай холбоотой урлагийн систем (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) ихэвчлэн олон ажлын суралцах системийг ашигладаг. Гэхдээ эдгээр нэмэлт даалгаваруудын тухай мэдээллүүд нь сайхан шийдвэрлэл, үйл явдал гаргах нь үргэлж хэцүү (эсвэл илүү хэцүү) байдаг. Энэ ажлын тулд бид ENPAR-ын өмнөх сургалтын арга замыг хамтдаа гаргах үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулахын тулд санал өгдөг. ENPAR цуглуулахад илүү амархан зүйлсийн нэмэлт нэгжүүдийн илтгэл шаардлагатай. Ихэнх сургуулийн ажлын ялгаа ганцхан нэгж мэдээллийг өгүүлбэр коддоор оруулахын тулд бид нэгж хоёр мэдээллийг ашиглаж байна. Ялангуяа бид дөрвөн шинэ зорилго, т.е. нүүрстөрөгчийн бичлэг, нүүрстөрөгчийн тодорхойлолт, эсрэг нөхцөл тодорхойлолт, пермутацийн тодорхойлолт төлөвлөгдөж байдаг. Тухайн туршилтууд нь сургалтын өмнө сургалтын арга хэмжээ нь ACE05, SciERC, NYT болон ACE05 дээрх BERT дээр маш чухал сайжруулах боломжтой болж байгааг харуулж байна.', 'ml': 'സഹസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ ബന്ധം പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള നിലവിലുള്ള സ്റ്റേറ്റ്- ഓഫ്- കല്\u200dസിസ്റ്റം സംവിധാനങ്ങള്\u200d (ലൂവാന്\u200d എ.എല്\u200d., 2019; വാദ്-ഡെ എന്നാലും കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ് റിസ്റ്റേഷനും സംഭവ്യത്തിന്റെ പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതും പോലുള്ള ഈ കൂടുതല്\u200d ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് വിഷമങ്ങള്\u200d എപ ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പ്രോഗ്രേനിക്കുന്ന രീതിയില്\u200d എന്\u200dപാര്\u200d മുന്\u200dപ് പരിശീലിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക് എന്\u200dപാര്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ശേഖരിക്കാന്\u200d എളുപ്പമുള്ള കൂടുതല്\u200d വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d മാത്രമേ ആവശ്യമുള്ളൂ. നിലവിലുള്ള ഏറ്റവും പ്രവൃത്തികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വാക്കിന്റെ കോഡോര്\u200dഡിലേക്ക് ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി മാത്രമേ വ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d നാലു നോവല്\u200d ലക്ഷ്യങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു, മുഖം മൂടിയ വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d ടൈപ്പ് ചെയ്യുന്നു, മുഖം മൂടിയ വസ്തുക്കളുടെ പ്രവചനം, വിരോധമായ വ്യത്യാസ് പ്രൊത്തികമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മുന്നില പരിശീലനങ്ങള്\u200d ACE05, സ്കിയെര്\u200dസി, NYT-നെക്കുറിച്ച് ബെര്\u200dട', 'pl': 'Obecne najnowocześniejsze systemy ekstrakcji relacji wspólnych podmiotów (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) zwykle przyjmują wielozadaniowe ramy uczenia się. Jednak adnotacje dla tych dodatkowych zadań, takich jak rozwiązywanie współreferencji i ekstrakcja zdarzeń, są zawsze równie trudne (lub jeszcze trudniejsze) do uzyskania. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy metodę przedszkoleniową ENPAR w celu poprawy wydajności ekstrakcji stawów. ENPAR wymaga tylko dodatkowych adnotacji jednostek, które są znacznie łatwiejsze do zebrania. W przeciwieństwie do większości istniejących prac, które uwzględniają tylko włączenie informacji o jednostkach do kodera zdań, dalej wykorzystujemy informacje o parze jednostek. W szczególności opracowujemy cztery nowe cele, tj. typowanie jednostek maskowanych, predykcja jednostek maskowanych, dyskryminacja kontekstu przeciwnego i predykcja permutacji, aby wstępnie przeszkoloć koder jednostek i koder pary jednostek. Kompleksowe eksperymenty pokazują, że proponowana metoda przedtreningowa osiąga znaczącą poprawę w stosunku do BERT na ACE05, SciERC i NYT oraz przewyższa obecny stan techniki na ACE05.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිදේශ ස්ථිතිය (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට විශේෂ විදි නමුත්, මේ අවශ්\u200dය වැඩක් සඳහා අවශ්\u200dය වැඩක් සඳහා අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාසය සහ අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාසය සමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසය සමාන මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉදිරියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ENPAR එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න. ENPAR අවශ්\u200dය විතරයි සම්බන්ධ කරන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි. වාක්ය සංකේතකයේ තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් ගොඩක් වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන් විතරයි, අපි තවත් අංක්\u200dරියා ජ විශේෂයෙන්ම, අපි සංවිධානය විදිහට නියම් අක්ෂ හතරයි, ඉතින්, මැස්ක් අක්ෂිත අක්ෂිත අක්ෂිත අක්ෂිත අක්ෂිත අක්ෂිත අක්ෂිත අක්ෂිත අක්ෂ සම්පූර්ණ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනවා ACE05, SciERC, NYT ව', 'no': 'Gjeldande status-of-the-art system for joint entity relation extraction (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) gjev vanlegvis det fleire oppgåve læringsrammeverket. Notasjonar for desse tilleggsvisa oppgåva, slik som oppløysing av koreferanse og utpakking av hendingar, er alltid like vanskeleg (eller til og med vanskeleg) å få. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi ein føreøvingsmetode ENPAR for å forbetra den kople utpakkinga. ENPAR krev berre dei ekstra entitetsnotasjonane som er mykje enklare å samla. I motsetning til dei fleste eksisterande arbeidane som berre gjer betre å inkludere entitetsinformasjon i setningskooderen, brukar vi meir informasjonen om entitetspar. Spesielt har vi laga fire romanske mål, t.d. maskerte entitetstyping, maskerte entitetsforhåndsvising, diskriminasjon av negativ kontekst, og forhåndsvising av permutasjon, for å foretrekke eit entitetskoder og eit entitetskoder. Kompleksive eksperimenter viser at den foreslåde føreøvingsmetoden gjer betydelig forbedring over BERT på ACE05, SciERC og NYT, og utfører gjeldande tilstanden på ACE05.', 'ro': 'Sistemele actuale de ultimă generație pentru extragerea relațiilor de entitate comună (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) adoptă de obicei cadrul de învățare multi-task. Cu toate acestea, adnotările pentru aceste sarcini suplimentare, cum ar fi rezoluția corefenței și extragerea evenimentelor, sunt întotdeauna la fel de greu (sau chiar mai greu) de obținut. În această lucrare, propunem o metodă de pre-formare ENPAR pentru îmbunătățirea performanței de extracție a articulațiilor. ENPAR necesită doar adnotările suplimentare ale entităților care sunt mult mai ușor de colectat. Spre deosebire de majoritatea lucrărilor existente care consideră doar încorporarea informațiilor entității în codificatorul de propoziții, noi utilizăm în continuare informațiile perechea entităților. În mod specific, concepem patru obiective noi, adică tiparea entităților mascate, predicția entităților mascate, discriminarea contextului adversar și predicția permutării, pentru a pregăti un codificator de entități și un codificator de perechi de entități. Experimentele cuprinzătoare arată că metoda de pre-formare propusă obține îmbunătățiri semnificative față de BERT pe ACE05, SciERC și NYC și depășește performanțele actuale de ultimă oră pe ACE05.', 'sv': 'Nuvarande state-of-the-art system för gemensamt entitetsförhållande extraktion (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) antar vanligtvis ramverket för multi-task lärande. Noteringar för dessa ytterligare uppgifter som coreferencelopplösning och händelseutvinning är dock alltid lika svåra (eller ännu svårare) att få fram. I detta arbete föreslår vi en pre-training metod ENPAR för att förbättra ledextraktionens prestanda. ENPAR kräver endast de ytterligare entitetsanteckningar som är mycket lättare att samla in. Till skillnad från de flesta befintliga verk som endast överväger att införliva entitetsinformation i meningskodaren, använder vi ytterligare entitetsparets information. Specifikt utformar vi fyra nya mål, dvs. maskerad entitetstypning, maskerad entitetsförutsägelse, kontradiktorisk kontextdiskriminering och permutationsförutsägelse, för att förbereda en entitetskodare och en entitetsparskodare. Omfattande experiment visar att den föreslagna pre-training metoden uppnår betydande förbättringar jämfört med BERT på ACE05, SciERC och NYC, och överträffar nuvarande state-of-the-art på ACE05.', 'ta': 'இணைப்பு பொருள் தொடர்பு பிரித்தலுக்கான தற்போதைய நிலைமை- கலை அமைப்புகள் (லூயான் et al., 2019; Wad- den et al., 2019) வழக்கமாக பல பணி கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் சட்டத் ஆனால், கூடுதல் தெளிவுத்திறன் மற்றும் நிகழ்வு வெளியீட்டு போன்ற இந்த செயல்களுக்கு குறிப்புகள் எப்போதும் சமமாக (அல்லது  இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு முன் பயிற்சி முறைமையை ENPAR முன்னோட்டம் செய்து கொண்டு வெளியீடு செயல்பாட்டை மே ENPAR கூடுதல் பொருள் அறிவிப்புகள் மட்டும் தேவைப்படுகிறது அதை சேகரிக்க மிகவும் எளிதானது. வாக்கியின் குறியீட்டில் உள்ள செயல்களை மட்டும் சேர்க்க மட்டும் கருதும் பெரும்பாலும் இருக்கும் செயல்கள் மாறுபட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட நாம் நான்கு புதிய குறியீடுகளை உருவாக்குகிறோம், அதாவது, முகத்திடப்பட்ட பொருள் தட்டு, முகத்திடப்பட்ட பொருள் எதிர்பார்ப்பு, எதிர்மறை சூழல் வீணாக்கல்,  முழுமையான சோதனைகள் காண்பிக்கப்படும் முன்னோட்டு பயிற்சி முறைமையை ACE05, SciERC மற்றும் NYT மேலும் முக்கியமான முன்னோட்டம் செய்யும் முறைமையை கா', 'so': 'Isticmaalka xiriirka wadajirka ah ee wadajirka ah (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) sida caadiga ah waxay qaadaan iskuul waxbarasho badan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee shaqooyinkaas dheeraad ah, tusaale ahaan xafiiska kaalmada iyo soo bixinta dhacdooyinku waa si adag (ama si ka daran) in ay helaan. Markaas waxan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab ka horeysa waxbarasho ah ENPAR si aan u hagaajinno sameynta wadajirka. ENPAR wuxuu uun u baahan yahay qalabka caadiga ah oo aad u fudud in la soo ururiyo. Unlike most existing works that only consider incorporating entity information into the sentence encoder, we further utilize the entity pair information.  Si gaar ah, waxaynu qoraynaa afar meelood oo sawir ah, taas oo ah wax lagu qorayo, wax lagu sii sheego, takoorista ka geesta ah, iyo wax la sii sheego nidaamka sharciga, si aan horay ugu tababarinno qodeynta dhamaanka iyo labo qodob ah. Imtixaanka kaamilka ah waxay muujiyaan in qaabkii lagu soo jeeday waxbarasho-horaadka uu ku soo jeeday ay uu ka soo kordhiyo BERT xagga ACE05, SciERC, iyo NYT, wuxuuna sameeyaa xaaladda hore ee ACE05.', 'ur': 'اکٹی ٹیٹی کی تعلیم کے لئے موجود ایٹنی سیسٹم (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) معمولاً بہت سی ٹیٹی کی تعلیم چوکات کو قبول کرتا ہے. لیکن ان اضافہ کاروں کے لئے یادہانی جیسے رضامندی رضامندی اور حادثہ اٹھانے کے لئے ہمیشہ برابر (یا اس سے بھی زیادہ مشکل) ہیں۔ ہم نے اس کام میں ایک پیش ترسین طریقہ ENPAR کی پیش ترسین کرتا ہے کہ joint extraction performance improved. ENPAR صرف اضافہ انٹیٹی انٹیٹیوں کی ضرورت ہے جو جمع کرنے کے لئے بہت آسان ہیں. بہت سے موجود کاروں کے مطابق جو صرف اتنی معلومات کو sentence encoder میں شامل کرنا سمجھتے ہیں، ہم اتنی جفت معلومات کو اضافہ کرتے ہیں. خاص طور پر، ہم چار روانی موضوع کی تدبیر کرتے ہیں، یعنی، ماسک ایٹنی ٹائیپینگ، ماسک ایٹنی کی پیش بینی، مخالف کنٹیکس تدبیر، اور پھیر پھیر پھیر دینے کی پیش بینی، ایک ایٹنی کوڈر اور ایک ایٹنی جوڑی کوڈر کی پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے۔ پیچیدہ آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیش آموزش کی طریقہ ACE05, SciERC اور NYT پر BERT کے ذریعہ بڑی زیادتی حاصل کرتی ہے اور ACE05 پر موجود آزمائش کی حالت سے زیادتی کرتی ہے.', 'sr': 'Trenutni sistem umetnosti za izvlačenje veze sa zajedničkim subjektima (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) obično usvaja okvir učenja više zadataka. Međutim, annotacije za te dodatne zadatke kao što su rezolucija pristojnosti i izvlačenje događaja uvek su jednako teže (ili još teže) dobiti. U ovom poslu predlažemo metodu predobuke ENPAR da poboljša zajedničku izvlačenje. ENPAR zahteva samo dodatne oznake entiteta koje su mnogo lakše skupljanje. Za razliku od većine postojećih radova koje smatraju uključivanjem informacija o entitetu u koder rečenice, dalje koristimo informacije o par entiteta. Posebno, razmišljamo o četiri nove ciljeva, tj. maskirano pisanje entiteta, predviđanje maskiranog entiteta, diskriminacija protiv konteksta i predviđanje permutacije, da predobučimo koder entiteta i koder par entiteta. Komplektivni eksperimenti pokazuju da predloženi metod predobuke postiže značajno poboljšanje BERT na ACE05, SciERC i NYT-u i nadmašuje trenutno stanje umjetnosti na ACE05.', 'vi': 'Các hệ thống hiện đại cho các tổ chức liên kết hợp (Luran et al., 209; Wad-den et al., 209) thường chọn ra bộ chế tập huấn đa nhiệm. Tuy nhiên, ghi chú cho những nhiệm vụ bổ sung như là giải quyết hạn cầu và giải cứu các sự kiện luôn luôn khó (hoặc thậm chí khó hơn) đạt được. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp chuẩn bị huấn luyện cho cho công trình khai thác chung. Công ty bảo kê chỉ yêu cầu ghi chú đầy đủ mà dễ thu thập hơn nhiều. Không giống hầu hết các công trình tồn tại mà chỉ tính toán thông tin về thực thể vào bộ mã hóa câu, chúng tôi sử dụng thêm thông tin thực thể cặp. Đặc biệt, chúng tôi lập ra bốn mục tiêu mới, như là đánh chữ đeo mặt, dự đoán về mặt mặt nạ, phân biệt ngữ cảnh đối nghịch, và dự đoán hoán vị, để chuẩn bị sẵn bộ mã hóa tổ hợp và mã hóa tổ hợp. Những thí nghiệm đầy đủ cho thấy rằng phương pháp được đề xuất trước khi đào tạo đạt hiệu quả cải thiện đáng kể hơn BERT trên ACG5, SciERC và NYU, và tiến bộ vượt trội hiện nay trên ACO5.', 'uz': "Name Lekin, bu qoʻshimcha vazifalar, balki murojaat resolution va hodisa chiqarish davomida taʼminlovchilar davom etish (yoki eng qiyin) juda qiyin. Bu ishda, biz birinchi taʼminlovchi usulni yaxshi ko'paytirish uchun ENPAR usulini tahlil qilamiz. Name @ info Ko'rsatilgan, biz to'rtta novel obʼektlarini yaratishimiz mumkin, masalan o'zgartirish quyidagi obʼektlarni o'zgartirish, bizga ta'minlovchi darajadagi tezlik va taʼminlovlovchi soʻzni taʼminlovchi narsalarni birinchi marta ko'paytirish uchun. Muddati taʼminlovchi tizimlarni koʻrsatish mumkin, talab qilingan pre-training usuli ACE05, SciERC va NYT bilan BERT haqida juda muhim yaxshi bajaradi va ACE05'da joriy kunlarning holatini bajaradi.", 'da': 'Nuværende state-of-the-art systemer til fælles enhedsrelation ekstraktion (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) vedtager normalt multi-task learning framework. Anmærkninger til disse yderligere opgaver som coreferenceopløsning og hændelsesekstraktion er dog altid lige så svære (eller endnu sværere) at få fat i. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en pre-training metode ENPAR for at forbedre ledekstraktionsydelsen. ENPAR kræver kun de ekstra enhedsnoteringer, der er meget lettere at indsamle. I modsætning til de fleste eksisterende værker, der kun overvejer at indarbejde entitetsoplysninger i sætningskoderen, bruger vi yderligere entitetsparrets oplysninger. Specielt udtænker vi fire nye mål, dvs. maskeret entitetstypning, maskeret entitetsforudsigelse, modstridende kontekst diskrimination og permutation forudsigelse, for at forududdanne en entitetskoder og en entitetspar encoder. Omfattende eksperimenter viser, at den foreslåede præ-træningsmetode opnår betydelige forbedringer i forhold til BERT på ACE05, SciERC og NYC og overgår nuværende state-of-the-art på ACE05.', 'nl': 'Huidige state-of-the-art systemen voor gezamenlijke entiteitsverhoudingen extractie (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) hanteren meestal het multitasking leerkader. Annotaties voor deze aanvullende taken zoals coreferentie resolutie en event extractie zijn echter altijd even moeilijk (of zelfs moeilijker) te verkrijgen. In dit werk stellen we een pre-training methode ENPAR voor om de gezamenlijke extractie prestaties te verbeteren. ENPAR vereist alleen de extra entiteitnotaties die veel gemakkelijker te verzamelen zijn. In tegenstelling tot de meeste bestaande werken die alleen overwegen om entiteitsinformatie in de zinnencoder op te nemen, gebruiken we verder de entiteitspaar informatie. Specifiek, bedenken we vier nieuwe doelstellingen, namelijk gemaskeerde entiteiten typeren, gemaskeerde entiteiten voorspelling, tegenstrijdige context discriminatie en permutatie voorspelling, om een entiteitenencoder en een entiteitenpaar encoder vooraf te trainen. Uitgebreide experimenten tonen aan dat de voorgestelde pre-training methode significante verbetering bereikt ten opzichte van BERT op ACE05, SciERC en NYT, en overtreft de huidige state-of-the-art op ACE05.', 'id': 'Sistem state-of-the-art saat ini untuk ekstraksi hubungan entitas kongsi (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) biasanya mengadopsi kerangka belajar multi-tugas. Namun, anotasi untuk tugas tambahan ini seperti resolusi koreferensi dan ekstraksi peristiwa selalu sama sulit (atau bahkan lebih sulit) untuk mendapatkan. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan metode prapelatihan ENPAR untuk meningkatkan prestasi ekstraksi bersama. ENPAR hanya membutuhkan anotasi entitas tambahan yang jauh lebih mudah untuk dikumpulkan. Tidak seperti kebanyakan pekerjaan yang ada yang hanya mempertimbangkan inkorporasi informasi entitas ke dalam pengekode kalimat, kami lebih lanjut menggunakan informasi pasangan entitas. Secara spesifik, kita merencanakan empat tujuan baru, i.e., mengetik entitas bertopeng, prediksi entitas bertopeng, diskriminasi konteks lawan, dan prediksi permutasi, untuk melatih pengekodi entitas dan pengekodi pasangan entitas. Eksperimen komprensif menunjukkan bahwa metode prapelatihan yang diusulkan mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan atas BERT pada ACE05, SciERC, dan NYT, dan melampaui batas saat ini pada ACE05.', 'de': 'Aktuelle State-of-the-Art Systeme zur gemeinsamen Entity Relation Extraction (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) übernehmen in der Regel das Multi-Task Learning Framework. Anmerkungen für diese zusätzlichen Aufgaben wie Coreferenzauflösung und Ereignisextraktion sind jedoch immer gleich schwer (oder sogar schwieriger) zu erhalten. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir eine Vortrainingsmethode ENPAR vor, um die Gelenkextraktionsleistung zu verbessern. ENPAR benötigt nur die zusätzlichen Entity-Anmerkungen, die viel einfacher zu sammeln sind. Im Gegensatz zu den meisten existierenden Arbeiten, die nur die Integration von Entity-Informationen in den Satzkodierer berücksichtigen, verwenden wir die Entity-Paar-Informationen weiter. Konkret entwickeln wir vier neue Ziele, d.h. maskierte Entity Typing, maskierte Entity Vorhersage, adversariale Kontextdiskriminierung und Permutation Vorhersage, um einen Entity Encoder und einen Entity Pair Encoder vorzutrainieren. Umfangreiche Experimente zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagene Vortrainingsmethode signifikante Verbesserungen gegenüber BERT auf ACE05, SciERC und NYT erzielt und den aktuellen Stand der Technik auf ACE05 übertrifft.', 'ko': '현재 가장 선진적인 연합 실체 관계 추출 시스템(Luan 등, 2019년, Wad den 등, 2019년)은 보통 다중 임무 학습 틀을 채택한다.그러나 이러한 추가 작업의 주석 (예를 들어 공지 해석과 이벤트 추출) 은 항상 얻기 어렵다.이 작업에서 관절 추출 성능을 향상시키기 위한 사전 훈련 방법인 ENPAR을 제시했습니다.ENPAR에는 더 쉽게 수집할 수 있는 추가 솔리드 주석만 필요합니다.대부분의 실체 정보를 문장 인코더에 통합하는 것만 고려하는 기존 작업과 달리 우리는 실체를 이용하여 정보에 대한 접근을 한다.구체적으로 말하자면 우리는 네 가지 새로운 목표, 즉 실체 유형 엄폐, 실체 예측 엄폐, 대항적 상하문 식별과 교체 예측을 설계하여 실체 인코더와 실체 대 인코더를 미리 훈련시켰다.종합적인 실험에 의하면 제시된 예훈련 방법은ACE05,SciERC,NYT에서 BERT보다 현저한 개선이 있었고ACE05에서의 성능은 현재 가장 선진적인 예훈련 방법보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'fa': 'سیستم\u200cهای موقعیت هنری برای استخراج ارتباط متحده\u200cای (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) معمولاً چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار با این وجود، اخطار برای این کار اضافه\u200cای مثل حل\u200cسازی و خارج کردن اتفاق همیشه سخت (یا حتی سخت\u200cتر) برای پیدا کردن است. در این کار، ما یک روش پیش آموزش ENPAR را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا عملکرد استخراج مشترک را بهتر کند. ENPAR فقط برای جمع کردن اطلاعات زیادی نیاز دارد. برخلاف بیشترین کارهای موجود که فقط در نظر گرفتن اطلاعات entity در رمزگار جمله، ما اطلاعات جفت entity را بیشتر استفاده می کنیم. مخصوصا، ما چهار هدف رمانی را طراحی می کنیم، یعنی تایپ کردن entity masked, پیش بینی entity masked, اختلاف محیط دشمنی، و پیش بینی تغییر تغییر تغییر می کنیم، تا پیش از آموزش یک متحد entity and a pair entity encoder را آموزش دهیم. آزمایش\u200cهای کامل نشان می\u200cدهد که روش پیش آموزش پیش از آموزش پیشنهاد بر روی BERT در ACE05, SciERC و NYT، بهترین ترکیب بزرگی می\u200cیابد و در ACE05 حالت هنر فعلی را انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Current state-of-the-art systems for joint entity relation extraction (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) usually adopt the multi-task learning framework.  Hata hivyo, matatizo ya kazi hizi za ziada kama vile suluhisho la msingi na utekelezaji wa tukio huwa vigumu (au vigumu zaidi) kupata. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza njia ya mafunzo ya awali ya ENPAR kuboresha utendaji wa pamoja. ENPAR inahitaji tu matangazo ya ziada ambayo ni rahisi sana ya kukusanya. Tofauti na shughuli nyingi zilizopo ambazo zinachukulia taarifa za kuungiza na entity into the code of sentence, tunatumia zaidi taarifa mbili za entity. Kwa ujumla, tunapanga malengo ya riwaya nne, yaani entity unaoandika, utabiri wa kituo kilichovaa nguo, ubaguzi wa mazingira tofauti, na utabiri wa ruhusa, kufundisha kodi la entity na kodi ya viwili. Majaribio makubwa yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu zilizopendekezwa katika mafunzo ya kabla ya mafunzo inaweza kupata maboresho makubwa zaidi ya BERT kwenye ACE05, SciERC na NYT, na kutekeleza hali ya sanaa ya sasa kwenye ACE05.', 'tr': "Häzirki ýerleşdirim baglanyşyklaryň(Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) köplenç bir multi-täbli öwrenme çerçevesini ulanýar. Yönetici, bu ekleme görevlerinin yönelik çözümleri ve olar çıkarmak gibi duyurular her zaman aynı şekilde zor (ya da daha zor) ulaşırlar. Bu işde ENPAR'yň öňünden öňünden okuwçylygy çykarmak üçin bir teklip berýäris. ENPAR toplamak üçin bireme aňsatlyk üçin diňe bireme hasaplamak gerek. Diňe bir zat maglumaty ködleşine tertiblenýän işleriň ýaly, biz bu durum çift maglumaty ullanýarys. Adatça, biz dört roman maksady tasarlýarys,myselýet taýýarlamak maskeldär, maskeldär gurama, tehlikeli kontekst diskriminasiýasy we permutasy öňünde bir zat kodçysyny we bir zat çift kodçysyny öňünden öňünden çykarýarys. Täzelikli deneyler görkezilýän öňünden öňünden öňünden eğitim metodasynyň ACE05, SciERC we NYT üstünde BERT we şu wagtky sanat taýýarlaryny üstüne çykarýar.", 'sq': 'Sistemet aktuale më të larta për nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve të përbashkëta të njësisë (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) zakonisht miratojnë kuadrin e mësimit me shumë detyra. Megjithatë, anotacionet për këto detyra shtesë të tilla si zgjidhja e koreferencës dhe nxjerrja e ngjarjeve janë gjithmonë të vështira (ose edhe më të vështira) për të arritur. Në këtë punë, propozojmë një metodë paratrajnimi ENPAR për të përmirësuar performancën e përbashkët të nxjerrjes. ENPAR kërkon vetëm anotacionet shtesë të njësisë që janë shumë më të lehta për të mbledhur. Në kundërshtim me shumicën e punëve ekzistuese që konsiderojnë vetëm përfshirjen e informacionit të njësisë në koduesin e fjalëve, ne përdorim më tej informacionin e çiftit të njësisë. Veçan ërisht, ne krijojmë katër objektiva të reja, pra, shkrimi i njësisë së maskuar, parashikimi i njësisë së maskuar, diskriminimi i kontekstit kundërshtar dhe parashikimi i permutacionit, për të paratrajnuar një kodues njësie dhe një kodues çifti njësi. Eksperimentet e përgjithshme tregojnë se metoda e propozuar parastërvitjeje arrin përmirësim të rëndësishëm mbi BERT në ACE05, SciERC dhe NYT dhe tejkalon gjendjen aktuale të teknologjisë në ACE05.', 'bg': 'Настоящите съвременни системи за съвместно извличане на взаимоотношения между субектите (Луан и др., 2019; Уад-ден и др., 2019) обикновено приемат рамката за обучение с множество задачи. Въпреки това, анотациите за тези допълнителни задачи като разделителна способност на кореференцията и извличане на събития винаги са еднакво трудни (или дори по-трудни) за получаване. В тази работа предлагаме метод за предварителна подготовка за подобряване на показателите на екстракция на ставите. ENPAR изисква само допълнителните анотации на единиците, които са много по-лесни за събиране. За разлика от повечето съществуващи произведения, които разглеждат само включването на информация за единици в кодера на изречения, ние допълнително използваме информацията за двойката единици. По-конкретно, ние разработваме четири нови цели, т.е. маскирано типиране на обекти, маскирано предсказване на обекти, дискриминация на контекста на конкуренцията и предсказване на пермутацията, за да подготвим предварително кодер на обекти и кодер за двойки обекти. Цялостните експерименти показват, че предложеният метод за предобучение постига значително подобрение спрямо BERT на ACE05, SciERC и NYT и превъзхожда текущото състояние на техниката на ACE05.', 'am': 'የአሁኑ የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-አርእስት ስርዓት (ሉan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) በተለመደው የብዙ-ስራ ትምህርት ፍሬም ይጠይቃሉ፡፡ However, annotations for these additional tasks such as coreference resolution and event extraction are always equally hard (or even harder) to obtain.  በዚህ ሥራ፣ የብሔራዊ ውጤት አካባቢውን ለማድረግ የፊተኛውን ትምህርት የENPAR ሥርዓት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ENPAR ለመሰብሰብ በጣም ቀላል የተጨማሪው አካል ማስታወሻ ብቻ ያስፈልጋል። በአካባቢው ሥራ የሚቆጠሩ አካባቢ መረጃዎችን ወደ ፍርድ ኮድ ማሳየት ብቻ እንደተካፈሉ፣ አካባቢውን ሁለትን መረጃ እናጠቃለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ አራት አካባቢዎች፣ አካባቢ አካባቢ ማተሚያ፣ የዓይነት አካባቢ ትንቢት፣ በተቃዋሚ የሥርዓት ግንኙነት እና የፍቃድ ውይይት፣ አካባቢ ኮድዶችን እና አካባቢ ሁለትን ማሳየት እና አካባቢ ኮድዶችን እና ማሳየት እናደርጋለን፡፡ ሙሉ ፈተናዎች በACE05፣ ስኩሪክ እና NYT ላይ በBERT ላይ ትልቅ ትክክል ማድረግ እንዲያገኙ እና በACE05 ላይ የአሁኑን የልዩ ትርጉም ሥርዓት እንዲደረግ ያሳያል፡፡', 'az': 'Həmçinin birləşdirilmiş məlumat əlaqəsi ilə əlaqəsi ilə birləşdirilmək sistemlərinin hökmünün durumu (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019). Ancaq bu əlavə etdikləri işlər üçün mərhəmət çətinlikləri və olaraq çıxarılması həmişə qədər ağır (ya da daha zordur) ola bilər. Bu işdə, ENPAR təhsil etmək üçün birlikdə istifadə etmək üçün ön təhsil metodu təklif edirik. ENPAR ancaq toplamaq üçün çox asan olaraq daha asan olan əlavə məlumatları lazımdır. Bütün məlumatların sadəcə entitə məlumatlarını cümlət kodlayıcısına daxil etməyə baxmayan işlərə bənzər, biz entitə çift məlumatlarını daha da istifadə edirik. Özellikle, biz dörd yeni məqsəd, t.i., maskalı bir entitə yazmaq, maskalı bir entitə öngörünü, düşmənçi məlumat diskriminasiya və permutasyon öngörünü, bir entitə kodlayıcını və bir entitə çift kodlayıcını öyrənmək üçün hazırlamışıq. Müxtəlif təcrübə metodlarının ACE05, SciERC və NYT üzerində BERT ilə möhkəm təcrübə göstərilməsini göstərir və ACE05 üzerində şiddətli təcrübə müqabilində istifadə edir.', 'hy': 'Այսօրվա ամենահետաքրքիր համակարգերը, որոնք օգտագործում են միասին կապերի վերացման համար (Luan et al., 2019; Wald-den et al., 2019), սովորաբար ընդունում են բազմախնդիրների ուսուցման շրջանակը: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս ավելացյալ խնդիրների, ինչպիսիք են կորեֆերանսի լուծումը և իրադարձությունների դուրս բերումը, նկարագրությունները միշտ նույնքան դժվար են (կամ նույնիսկ ավելի դժվար) հասնել: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք նախապատրաստման մեթոդ ԷնՊար, որպեսզի բարելավվի միասին վերացման արդյունքը: Ենպարը պահանջում է միայն ավելացնող միավորների նշումներ, որոնք շատ ավելի հեշտ են հավաքել: Ի տարբերություն գոյություն ունեցող աշխատանքների մեծ մասի, որոնք մտածում են միայն կազմակերպության ինֆորմացիայի ներառումը նախադասության կոդերի մեջ, մենք ավելի շատ օգտագործում ենք կազմակերպության զույգ տեղեկատվությունը Հատկապես, մենք ստեղծում ենք չորս նոր նպատակներ, այսինքն՝ թաքնված էության տպեր, թաքնված էության կանխատեսումներ, հակառակ կոնտեքստի խտրականություններ և կանխատեսումներ, որպեսզի նախապատրաստենք էության կոդեր և էության զույգ կոդեր: Ընդհանուր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկած նախապատրաստ մեթոդը ACE2005, գիտERC և NYT-ի BER-ի դեպքում նշանակալի բարելավում է և արտադրում է ACE2005-ի ներկայիս ամենակարևոր վիճակը:', 'bn': 'যুক্ত বস্তুর সম্পর্ক বের করার জন্য বর্তমান রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প সিস্টেম (লুয়ান এন্ট আল, ২০১৯; ওয়াদ-ডেন এন আল, ২০১৯) সাধারণত বহুক্ষেত্র শিক্ষা  কিন্তু এই কাজের জন্য যেমন করফেন্সের সিদ্ধান্ত এবং অনুষ্ঠানের বিনিময়ে সবসময় একই রকম কঠিন (অথবা আরও কঠিন) পেতে পারে। এই কাজে আমরা প্রশিক্ষণের পূর্ববর্তী পদ্ধতি এনপারের প্রস্তাব করি যাতে যোগাযোগ বিনিময়ের কাজ উন্নত করার জন্য। এনপার শুধুমাত্র অতিরিক্ত বস্তুর ব্যাপারের প্রয়োজন যা সংগ্রহের জন্য সহজ। বিদ্যমান বিভিন্ন বিষয়বস্তুর তথ্য শুধুমাত্র বাক্য এনকোডারে যোগাযোগ করার বিষয়টি বিবেচনা করা যায়, আমরা এই বস্তুর জোড়া ত বিশেষ করে, আমরা চারটি উপন্যাসের উদ্দেশ্য পরিকল্পনা করি, যেমন মুখোশিত বস্তুর টাইপিং, মুখোশিত বস্তুর ভবিষ্যত, বিরোধী প্রেক্ষিতে বৈষম্য, এবং অনুমতি প্রদর্শনের জন্য, একটি বস্তুর সম্পূর্ণ পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত প্রশিক্ষণের পূর্ববর্তী পদ্ধতি ACE05, স্কিয়ার্সি এবং NYT-এ বিবেরেটের উপর গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নতি পাবে এবং ACE', 'af': "Huidige state-of-the-art stelsels vir joint entities relation extraction (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) aanvaar gewoonlik die multi-task leer raamwerk. Maar, notasies vir hierdie addisionele taak soos koreferensie oplossing en gebeurtenis uittrek is altyd gelyk moeilik (of selfs harder) om te kry. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n voor-oerwinning metode ENPAR om die joint extraction performance te verbeter. ENPAR benodig slegs die addisionele entiteit-notasies wat baie makliker is om te samel. Ongelyks van die meeste bestaande werke wat slegs beskou om entiteit inligting te inkorporeer in die setkoder, gebruik ons verder die entiteit paar inligting. Spesifieke, ons stel vier nuwe objekte, i.e. maskeerde entiteit-tiping, maskeerde entiteit-voorskou, teenstandaarde konteks-diskriminasie en permutasie-voorskou, om 'n entiteitenkoder en 'n entiteit-paar enkoder voor te trein. Kompleksiewe eksperimente wys dat die voorgestelde voor-oefening metode betaling verbetering oor BERT op ACE05, SciERC en NYT bereik en uitvoer die huidige staat van-kuns op ACE05.", 'cs': 'Současné nejmodernější systémy pro extrakci vztahů společných entit (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) obvykle přijímají víceúkolový vzdělávací rámec. Nicméně, anotace pro tyto další úkoly, jako je rozlišení koreference a extrakce událostí, jsou vždy stejně obtížné (nebo ještě těžší) získat. V této práci navrhujeme metodu předškolení ENPAR pro zlepšení výkonnosti kloubové extrakce. ENPAR vyžaduje pouze další anotace entity, které se mnohem snadněji sbírají. Na rozdíl od většiny existujících děl, které zvažují pouze začlenění informací o entitě do kódéru vět, dále využíváme informace o páru entit. Konkrétně navrhujeme čtyři nové cíle, tj. typování maskovaných entit, predikci maskovaných entit, diskriminaci nepřátelského kontextu a predikci permutace, abychom předem trénovali kodér entity a kodér páru entit. Komplexní experimenty ukazují, že navržená metoda předtréninku dosahuje významného zlepšení oproti BERT na ACE05, SciERC a NYT a překonává současný stav techniky ACE05.', 'et': 'Praegused kaasaegsed süsteemid ühiste üksuste suhete kaevandamiseks (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) võtavad tavaliselt kasutusele mitme ülesandega õppimise raamistiku. Siiski on nende lisaülesannete, nagu näiteks kordferentsilahendus ja sündmuste ekstraheerimine, märkmeid alati võrdselt raske (või isegi raskem) saada. Selles töös pakume välja koolituseelse meetodi ENPAR, et parandada liigese ekstraheerimise jõudlust. ENPAR nõuab ainult täiendavaid olemi märkuseid, mida on palju lihtsam koguda. Erinevalt enamikust olemasolevatest töödest, mis kaaluvad ainult olemiteabe lisamist lausekodeerijasse, kasutame me olemipaari teavet. Täpsemalt töötame välja neli uut eesmärki, st maskeeritud olemi tüüpimine, maskeeritud olemi ennustamine, konteksti diskrimineerimine ja permutatsiooni ennustamine, et eelkoolitada olemi kodeerijat ja olemipaari kodeerijat. Põhjalikud katsed näitavad, et kavandatud koolituseelse meetodiga saavutatakse märkimisväärne paranemine võrreldes BERTiga ACE05, SciERC ja NYT ning ületatakse praegust tehnika taset ACE05 puhul.', 'fi': 'Nykyaikaiset nykyaikaiset järjestelmät yhteisyhteisöjen suhteen uuttamiseksi (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) käyttävät yleensä monitehtävän oppimisen viitekehystä. Huomautukset näihin lisätehtäviin, kuten koreferenssin resoluutioon ja tapahtumapoimintaan, ovat kuitenkin aina yhtä vaikeita (tai jopa vaikeampia) saada. Tässä työssä ehdotamme ENPAR-esikoulutusmenetelmää nivelpoiston suorituskyvyn parantamiseksi. ENPAR edellyttää vain muita entiteettimerkintöjä, jotka on paljon helpompi kerätä. Toisin kuin useimmat olemassa olevat teokset, joissa harkitaan vain entiteettitiedon sisällyttämistä lausekooderiin, hyödynnämme edelleen entiteettiparin tietoja. Erityisesti kehitämme neljä uutta tavoitetta, eli masked entity typing, masked entity prediction, adversarial context discrimination ja permutation prediction, esikouluttamaan entity-kooderin ja entity pair -kooderin. Kattavat kokeet osoittavat, että ehdotetulla esikoulutusmenetelmällä saavutetaan merkittävää parannusta BERT:hen verrattuna ACE05:ssä, SciERC:ssä ja NYT:ssä ja että se on parempi kuin ACE05:ssä.', 'bs': 'Trenutni sistemi umetnosti za izvlačenje veze s zajedničkim subjektima (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) obično usvojavaju multi task učenje okvir. Međutim, annotacije za te dodatne zadatke kao što su rješenje pristojnosti i izvlačenje događaja uvijek su teže (ili još teže) dobiti. U ovom poslu predlažemo metodu predobuke ENPAR kako bi poboljšali zajedničku izvlačenje. ENPAR zahtijeva samo dodatne oznake entiteta koje su mnogo lakše prikupiti. Za razliku od većine postojećih radova koje smatraju uključujući informacije o entitetu u koder rečenice, dalje koristimo informacije o par entiteta. Posebno, određujemo četiri nove ciljeva, tj. maskirano pisanje entiteta, predviđanje maskiranog entiteta, diskriminacija protiv konteksta i predviđanje permutacije, da predobučimo koder entiteta i koder par entiteta. Uhvatljivi eksperimenti pokazuju da predloženi metod predobuke postiže značajno poboljšanje BERT na ACE05, SciERC i NYT-u i nadmašuje trenutno stanje umjetnosti na ACE05.', 'ca': "Els sistemes actuals d'última generació per l'extracció de relacions entre entitats conjuntes (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) normalment adopten el marc d'aprenentatge multitascat. No obstant això, les anotacions d'aquestes tasques adicionals com la resolució de coreferència i l'extracció d'esdeveniments sempre són igualment difícils (o encara més difícils) d'obtenir. En aquesta feina, proposem un mètode de pré-capacitació ENPAR per millorar el rendiment de l'extracció conjunta. ENPAR només requereix anotacions adicionals d'entitats que són molt més fàcils de recollir. A diferència de la majoria de treballs existents que només consideran incorporar informació d'entitat al codificador de frases, utilitzem més la informació del parell d'entitats. Specifically, we devise four novel objectives,i.e., masked entity typing, masked entity prediction, adversarial context discrimination, and permutation prediction, to pre-train an entity encoder and an entity pair encoder.  Els experiments complets demostren que el mètode proposat de pré-capacitació aconsegueix una millora significativa en comparació amb el BERT en ACE05, SciERC i NYT, i supera l'actualitat actual en ACE05.", 'hr': 'Trenutni sustavi umjetnosti za izvlačenje odnosa o zajedničkim subjektima (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) obično usvajaju višezadatačni okvir učenja. Međutim, annotacije za te dodatne zadatke kao što su rješenje pristojnosti i izvlačenje događaja uvijek su teže (ili još teže) dobiti. U ovom poslu predlažemo metodu predobuke ENPAR kako bi poboljšali zajedničku izvlačenje. ENPAR zahtijeva samo dodatne oznake entiteta koje su mnogo lakše prikupiti. Za razliku od većine postojećih radova koje smatraju uključujući informacije o entitetu u koder rečenice, dalje koristimo informacije o par entiteta. Posebno, smislimo četiri nove ciljeva, tj. skrivanje maskiranog entiteta, predviđanje maskiranog entiteta, diskriminacija protiv konteksta i predviđanje permutacije, kako bi predobučili koder entiteta i koder par entiteta. Uhvatljivi eksperimenti pokazuju da predloženi metod predobuke postiže značajno poboljšanje BERT na ACE05, SciERC i NYT-u te nadmašuje trenutno stanje umjetnosti na ACE05.', 'jv': 'Perintah duruh-of-the-arts sistem kanggo nggawe jenis sing nggawe barang kelas kang extract (luan et al, 2011 9; Wad-Den et al, 2011) usual isinakke sistem multi-task Learning. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Nang lan iki, kita supoyo nggawe sistem preempri nggawe tresnaning, ENPAR nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe layang seneng pisan. ENPAR kudu mengko ajeng tho dadi angan kelas nang sampek. Tanggal barêng-barêng langkung karo akeh operasi sing sampeyan nêmên iso nggawe informasi Entèni kanggo koder tentang, kita nambah dhéwé iso nggawe informasi Entèni. CURRENTCURRENTCURRENTCURRENTCURRENTCURRENTCURRENT Wang comprebar', 'sk': 'Trenutni najsodobnejši sistemi za pridobivanje skupnih odnosov med subjekti (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) običajno sprejemajo večopravilni učni okvir. Vendar pa je opombe za ta dodatna opravila, kot sta ločljivost koreference in ekstrakcija dogodkov, vedno enako težko (ali celo težje) dobiti. V tem delu predlagamo metodo predusposabljanja ENPAR za izboljšanje učinkovitosti ekstrakcije sklepov. ENPAR zahteva samo dodatne pripombe entitete, ki jih je veliko lažje zbrati. Za razliko od večine obstoječih del, ki upoštevajo samo vključitev informacij o entitetah v kodirnik stavkov, nadalje uporabljamo informacije o parih entitet. Natančneje smo zasnovali štiri nove cilje, tj. maskirano tipkanje entitet, maskirano napovedovanje entitet, diskriminacijo konteksta konteksta konteksta in napovedovanje permutacij, za predusposabljanje kodirnika entitet in kodirnika par entitet. Celoviti poskusi kažejo, da predlagana metoda pred usposabljanjem doseže znatno izboljšanje v primerjavi z BERT pri ACE05, SciERC in NYT ter presega sedanje najsodobnejše pri ACE05.', 'ha': "Halin-state-of-the-art system for compound of association item (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) ɗammãnin su karya firam-na-aikin multi-aiki. Kayya, masu zartar da wa wannan aikin da ke ƙara kamar masu buɗawa da cire-dama da cire-aiki, sun zama daidai (ko kuma mafi tsanani) da za su iya sãmu. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗa wata metode ta gabã ɗaya na ENPAR dõmin ya kyautata surori na fita wadani. ENPAR yana ƙayyade alama masu ƙara da masu sauƙi da za'a sami. Di daidaita da mafiya yawan aikin da ke jira wanda kawai ke bincike information cikin kode-ɗabi'a, muna amfani da maɓalli guda biyu. A ƙayyade, muna ƙayyade wasu abubuwa huɗu cikin nowaya,misali, misalin misalin abun da aka rufe maɓalli, ka yi bayani ga abun da ke kiyaye, yin takardar da tsakanin aiki da kuma ka gabatar da kodi biyu na abun. Fitarakin da aka samu, na nuna cewa, metoden da aka buƙata wa zaman-Trainin ya sami muhimmin improvement game da BERT kan AE05, skaiERC da NYT, kuma yana ƙaranci halin-sanar da ke kai yanzu-na-kai kan AE05.", 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཐུན་པའི་དབང་ཆ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་བཀོད་པ་དང་རྗེས་སུ་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། འོན་ཀྱང་། བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་ཁྱད་པར་བྱ་འགུལ་འདི་ཚོ་དང་བྱ་འགུལ་གསལ་བཤད་ནི་རྟག་པར་ཐག་ཏེ། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་གི་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བསམ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ENPAR་དེ་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་པར་ལས་སླ་མོ་གཏོང་བའི་དབང་ཆ་ཁོ་ན་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་དགོས་པ ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དུ་དབུས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་མིན་པ་ལས་ཕར་ཆེན་པ། ཁྱད་པར་ན། ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་གྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་འདི་བཞིན་བཟོས་ཡོད། གསལ་བརྗོད་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་སྔོན་གྲངས་འབྱོར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་ཉེན་བརྟན་ན། BERT ། ACE05 དང་། SciERC དང་ NYT ལས་ད་ལྟོའི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་།', 'he': 'המערכות החדשות הנוכחיות לחילוץ יחסי יחסים ביחידות משותפים (Luan et al., 2019; Wad-den et al., 2019) בדרך כלל מאמצים את המסגרת הלימודים של משימות רבות. However, annotations for these additional tasks such as coreference resolution and event extraction are always equally hard (or even harder) to obtain.  In this work, we propose a pre-training method ENPAR to improve the joint extraction performance.  ENPAR דורש רק הערות היחידות נוספות הרבה יותר קלות לאסוף. בניגוד לרוב העבודות הקיומות ששוקלות רק להכניס מידע היחידות לקודד המשפטים, אנו משתמשים יותר במידע זוג היחידות. במיוחד, אנחנו מתכננים ארבעה מטרות חדשות, כלומר, טיפוס יחידות מסוכנת, חיזוי יחידות מסוכנת, פיצוי קשר נוגדי, וחזוי פרומטציה, כדי לאמן מראש קודד יחידות וקודד זוג יחידות. Comprehensive experiments show that the proposed pre-training method achieves significant improvement over BERT on ACE05, SciERC, and NYT, and outperforms current state-of-the-art on ACE05.'}
{'en': 'Modelling Context Emotions using Multi-task Learning for Emotion Controlled Dialog Generation', 'ar': 'نمذجة عواطف السياق باستخدام التعلم متعدد المهام من أجل إنشاء حوار يتم التحكم فيه عن طريق المشاعر', 'fr': "Modélisation des émotions contextuelles grâce à l'apprentissage multitâche pour la génération de dialogues contrôlés", 'es': 'Modelado de emociones de contexto mediante el aprendizaje multitarea para generar diálogos controlados por emociones', 'pt': 'Modelando emoções de contexto usando aprendizado multitarefa para geração de diálogos controlados por emoções', 'ja': '情動制御ダイアログ生成のためのマルチタスク学習を使用したコンテキスト情動のモデリング', 'zh': '用多任务学建模于上下文情,以成情制之对', 'hi': 'मॉडलिंग प्रसंग भावनाओं भावनाओं का उपयोग कर बहु-कार्य भावनाओं को नियंत्रित संवाद पीढ़ी के लिए सीखना', 'ru': 'Моделирование эмоций контекста с использованием многозадачного обучения для генерации диалога с контролем эмоций', 'ga': 'Mothúcháin Comhthéacs a Shamhaltú ag úsáid Foghlaim Ilthasc le haghaidh Giniúint Dialóige Rialaithe Mothúchán', 'ka': 'მოდელური კონტექსტის ემოციები, რომლებიც გამოყენებული მრავალური დასწავლება ემოციების კონტროლური დიალოგის შექმნა', 'hu': 'Érzelmek modellezése többfeladatos tanulással az érzelmek irányított párbeszéd generálásához', 'el': 'Μοντελοποίηση συναισθημάτων περιβάλλοντος χρησιμοποιώντας τη μάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών για τη δημιουργία διαλόγου ελεγχόμενου συναισθηματισμού', 'it': "Modellare le emozioni di contesto utilizzando l'apprendimento multi-task per la generazione di dialoghi controllati sulle emozioni", 'mk': 'Моделирање на контекстни емоции користејќи мултизадачно учење за генерација на дијалог со контрола на емоциите', 'lt': 'Modeliuoti konteksto emocijas naudojant daugiafunkcinį mokymąsi emocijų kontroliuojamo dialogo generacijai', 'kk': 'Көп тапсырмаларды басқару диалогын құру үшін көп тапсырмаларды оқыту көңіл көңіл күйлерін моделдеу', 'ms': 'Memodel Emosi Konteks menggunakan Pelajaran Berbagai Tugas untuk Jenerasi Dialog Dikawal Emosi', 'mt': 'L-Immudellar ta’ Emożjonijiet ta’ Kuntest bl-użu ta’ Tagħlim Multikompiti għall-Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Djalogu Kontrollat bl-Emożjonijiet', 'ml': 'ഇമോട്ടോഷന്\u200d നിയന്ത്രിക്കപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഡയലോഗ് ജനിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി പല- ജോലി പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന', 'mn': 'Эмгэгтэй Хэрэглэгдсэн Диалог боловсруулахын тулд олон үйл ажиллагааны суралцах мэдрэмж', 'pl': 'Modelowanie emocji kontekstowych za pomocą wielozadaniowego uczenia się dla generowania dialogów kontrolowanych emocjami', 'no': 'Comment', 'ro': 'Modelarea contextului Emoțiilor folosind Învățarea Multi-Task pentru generarea de dialog controlat emoțional', 'sr': 'Modeliranje emocija konteksta koristeći učenje više zadataka za generaciju dijaloga kontroliranog emocija', 'si': 'Emotion පාලනය කරපු සංවාදය නිර්මාණය සඳහා ගොඩක් වැඩක් ක්\u200dරියාවක් ඉගෙනගන්න භාවිත කළ සංවාදය', 'so': 'Isticmaalayaal waxbarasho badan oo aad u sameyneyso qalabka dhibaatooyinka', 'sv': 'Modellera kontext Känslor med hjälp av Multi-Task Learning för Emotion Controlled Dialog Generation', 'ta': 'உணர்வு கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்ட உரையாடல் உருவாக்கத்தை பயன்படுத்தி மாதிரியும் உள்ளடக்க உணர்வுகள்', 'ur': 'ایموٹیشن کنٹیکس ایموٹیشن کے مطابق بہت سی ٹاکس سیکھنے کے استعمال کرتے ہیں', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Mô phỏng cảm xúc ngữ cảnh dùng đa nhiệm để học thoại thao tác điều khiển cảm xúc', 'bg': 'Моделиране на контекстни емоции с помощта на многозадачи за генериране на емоционално контролиран диалог', 'da': 'Modellering af kontekst Følelser ved hjælp af Multi-task Learning for Emotion Controlled Dialog Generation', 'hr': 'Modeliranje emocija konteksta koristeći učenje više zadataka za generaciju dijaloga kontroliranog emocija', 'nl': 'Het modelleren van contextemoties met behulp van Multi-task Learning voor emotioneel gecontroleerde dialooggeneratie', 'id': 'Memodelkan Emosi Konteks menggunakan Belajar Multi-Tugas untuk Generasi Dialog Terkontrol Emosi', 'de': 'Modellierung von Kontextemotionen mit Multi-Task Learning zur emotionsgesteuerten Dialoggenerierung', 'ko': '정서 제어 대화를 바탕으로 생성된 다중 임무 학습 상황 정서 모델링', 'fa': 'Comment', 'sw': 'Hisia za Mpango wa Mitandao kwa kutumia Ufunzi wa Kazi nyingi kwa ajili ya Uzalishaji wa Dialogu inayodhibitiwa na Tatizo', 'tr': 'Emoýun Kontrol Däpli Görniş Opşenler üçin nusgala duýgular', 'af': 'Modelering Konteks Emotisies gebruik veelvuldige taak leer vir Emotisiebeheer Dialoog Genereer', 'sq': 'Modelimi i emocioneve të kontekstit duke përdorur Mësimin Multi-Tash për Gjenerimin e Dialogut të Kontrolluar me Emocion', 'am': 'የመስኮት ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Կոնտեքստի զգացմունքներ մոդելավորելը՝ օգտագործելով բազմախնդիրներ սովորելը զգացմունքների կառավարվող պատուհանների ստեղծման համար', 'az': 'Emotiyon Kontrol Dialoog Ünvanı üçün çoxlu işin öyrənməsini istifadə edən Kontext Emotiyaları', 'bn': 'ইমোটেশন নিয়ন্ত্রণ করা ডায়ালগ জেনারেশনের জন্য বহুক্ত কাজ শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করে মডেলিং বিষয়বস্তু ইমোটেশন', 'ca': 'Modelar les emocions contextuals fent servir aprenentatge multitascat per generar diàleg controlat amb emocions', 'bs': 'Modeliranje emocija konteksta koristeći učenje multitask za generaciju dijaloga kontroliranog emocija', 'cs': 'Modelování kontextových emocí pomocí Multi-Task Learning pro generování emocí řízených dialogů', 'et': 'Kontekstiemotsioonide modelleerimine, kasutades mitme ülesandega õppimist emotsioonide juhitava dialoogi loomiseks', 'fi': 'Kontekstitunteiden mallintaminen monitehtäväoppimisen avulla tunteiden hallittua dialogia varten', 'jv': 'Ngawe Model Kontext Emations Ngawe Jejaring Multi-task Learning kanggo Emaocion Kontroled Dialog Generation', 'sk': 'Modeliranje kontekstnih čustev z uporabo večopravilnega učenja za ustvarjanje dialoga z nadzorom čustev', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'דוגמנית רגשות קונטקסט בשימוש ללמוד במשימות רבות עבור יצירת שיחות שולטות ברגשות רגשות', 'bo': 'Modelling Context Emotions using Multi-task Learning for Emotion Controlled Dialog Generation'}
{'en': 'A recent topic of research in natural language generation has been the development of automatic response generation modules that can automatically respond to a user’s utterance in an empathetic manner. Previous research has tackled this task using neural generative methods by augmenting emotion classes with the input sequences. However, the outputs by these models may be inconsistent. We employ multi-task learning to predict the emotion label and to generate a viable response for a given utterance using a common encoder with multiple decoders. Our proposed encoder-decoder model consists of a self-attention based encoder and a decoder with dot product attention mechanism to generate response with a specified emotion. We use the focal loss to handle imbalanced data distribution, and utilize the consistency loss to allow coherent decoding by the decoders. Human evaluation reveals that our model produces more emotionally pertinent responses. In addition, our model outperforms multiple strong baselines on automatic evaluation measures such as F1 and BLEU scores, thus resulting in more fluent and adequate responses.', 'ar': 'كان موضوع البحث الأخير في توليد اللغة الطبيعية هو تطوير وحدات إنشاء استجابة تلقائية يمكنها الاستجابة تلقائيًا لنطق المستخدم بطريقة تعاطفية. عالجت الأبحاث السابقة هذه المهمة باستخدام الأساليب التوليدية العصبية من خلال زيادة فئات المشاعر مع تسلسل الإدخال. ومع ذلك ، قد تكون مخرجات هذه النماذج غير متسقة. نحن نستخدم التعلم متعدد المهام للتنبؤ بتسمية المشاعر ولتوليد استجابة قابلة للتطبيق لكلام معين باستخدام برنامج تشفير مشترك مع أجهزة فك ترميز متعددة. يتكون نموذج وحدة فك التشفير المقترح من جهاز تشفير قائم على الاهتمام الذاتي ووحدة فك ترميز مع آلية انتباه المنتج النقطي لتوليد استجابة مع عاطفة محددة. نستخدم الخسارة البؤرية للتعامل مع توزيع البيانات غير المتوازن ، ونستخدم فقدان الاتساق للسماح بفك تشفير متماسك بواسطة مفككات التشفير. يكشف التقييم البشري أن نموذجنا ينتج ردودًا أكثر صلة عاطفياً. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، يتفوق نموذجنا في الأداء على العديد من خطوط الأساس القوية في مقاييس التقييم التلقائي مثل درجات F1 و BLEU ، مما يؤدي إلى استجابات أكثر طلاقة وكافية.', 'pt': 'Um tópico recente de pesquisa em geração de linguagem natural tem sido o desenvolvimento de módulos de geração automática de respostas que podem responder automaticamente ao enunciado de um usuário de maneira empática. Pesquisas anteriores abordaram essa tarefa usando métodos generativos neurais, aumentando as classes de emoção com as sequências de entrada. No entanto, as saídas desses modelos podem ser inconsistentes. Empregamos o aprendizado multitarefa para prever o rótulo da emoção e gerar uma resposta viável para um determinado enunciado usando um codificador comum com vários decodificadores. Nosso modelo de codificador-decodificador proposto consiste em um codificador baseado em autoatenção e um decodificador com mecanismo de atenção por produto escalar para gerar resposta com uma emoção especificada. Usamos a perda focal para lidar com a distribuição de dados desequilibrada e utilizamos a perda de consistência para permitir uma decodificação coerente pelos decodificadores. A avaliação humana revela que nosso modelo produz respostas mais emocionalmente pertinentes. Além disso, nosso modelo supera várias linhas de base fortes em medidas de avaliação automática, como pontuações F1 e BLEU, resultando em respostas mais fluentes e adequadas.', 'es': 'Un tema de investigación reciente en la generación de lenguaje natural ha sido el desarrollo de módulos de generación de respuestas automáticas que pueden responder automáticamente a las declaraciones de un usuario de manera empática. Investigaciones anteriores han abordado esta tarea utilizando métodos neuronales generativos al aumentar las clases de emociones con las secuencias de entrada. Sin embargo, los resultados de estos modelos pueden ser inconsistentes. Empleamos el aprendizaje multitarea para predecir la etiqueta de emoción y generar una respuesta viable para un enunciado determinado mediante un codificador común con múltiples decodificadores. Nuestro modelo de codificador-decodificador propuesto consiste en un codificador basado en la autoatención y un decodificador con un mecanismo de atención de producto puntual para generar una respuesta con una emoción específica. Utilizamos la pérdida focal para manejar la distribución de datos desequilibrada y utilizamos la pérdida de consistencia para permitir una decodificación coherente por parte de los decodificadores. La evaluación humana revela que nuestro modelo produce respuestas más pertinentes emocionalmente. Además, nuestro modelo supera varias líneas de base sólidas en las medidas de evaluación automática, como los puntajes F1 y BLEU, lo que resulta en respuestas más fluidas y adecuadas.', 'fr': "Un sujet de recherche récent sur la génération du langage naturel a été le développement de modules de génération de réponse automatique capables de répondre automatiquement à l'énoncé d'un utilisateur de manière empathique. Des recherches antérieures ont abordé cette tâche à l'aide de méthodes génératives neuronales en augmentant les classes d'émotions avec les séquences d'entrée. Cependant, les sorties de ces modèles peuvent être incohérentes. Nous utilisons l'apprentissage multitâche pour prédire l'étiquette d'émotion et générer une réponse viable pour un énoncé donné à l'aide d'un encodeur commun doté de plusieurs décodeurs. Notre modèle d'encodeur-décodeur proposé comprend un codeur basé sur l'auto-attention et un décodeur avec un mécanisme d'attention par produit scalaire pour générer une réponse avec une émotion spécifiée. Nous utilisons la perte focale pour gérer une distribution de données déséquilibrée et utilisons la perte de cohérence pour permettre un décodage cohérent par les décodeurs. L'évaluation humaine révèle que notre modèle produit des réponses plus pertinentes sur le plan émotionnel. De plus, notre modèle surpasse plusieurs niveaux de référence solides sur les mesures d'évaluation automatiques telles que les scores F1 et BLEU, ce qui se traduit par des réponses plus fluides et plus adéquates.", 'ja': '自然言語生成における最近の研究のトピックは、共感的な方法でユーザーの発言に自動的に応答できる自動応答生成モジュールの開発である。 以前の研究では、入力シーケンスで感情クラスを拡張することによって、ニューラル生成法を使用してこの課題に取り組んできました。 しかしながら、これらのモデルによる出力は一貫していない可能性がある。 私たちは、感情ラベルを予測し、複数のデコーダを備えた共通のエンコーダを使用して所与の発話に対して実行可能な応答を生成するために、マルチタスク学習を採用しています。 私たちが提案するエンコーダーデコーダーモデルは、自己注目ベースのエンコーダーと、指定された感情で応答を生成するためのドット製品注目メカニズムを備えたデコーダーで構成されています。 焦点損失を使用して不均衡なデータ分布を処理し、一貫性損失を利用してデコーダによる一貫性のあるデコードを可能にします。 人間の評価は、私たちのモデルがより感情的に適切な反応を生み出すことを明らかにします。 さらに、F 1やBLEUスコアなどの自動評価尺度では、当社のモデルは複数の強力なベースラインを上回っているため、より流暢で適切な応答が得られます。', 'zh': '自然语言生近者研究课题发自应模块,模块可以移情自应用户语也。 前论已用神经成法解之,法用输入序增情类也。 然其输或不一。 用多任务学以知情,而用多解码器之通用编码器为给定语成可行之应。 吾所谓编码器-解码器者,编码器与点积机之解码器成,以生特定情之应。 吾用焦点失之以治不衡之数据分布,因一致性失以听解码器连解码。 人生评估明,吾道多关情。 若F1、BLEU分数)上优于数强基线,以生流畅之应。', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक भाषा पीढ़ी में अनुसंधान का एक हालिया विषय स्वचालित प्रतिक्रिया पीढ़ी मॉड्यूल का विकास रहा है जो स्वचालित रूप से एक सहानुभूतिपूर्ण तरीके से उपयोगकर्ता के उच्चारण का जवाब दे सकता है। पिछले शोध ने इनपुट अनुक्रमों के साथ भावना वर्गों को बढ़ाकर तंत्रिका जनन विधियों का उपयोग करके इस कार्य से निपटा है। हालांकि, इन मॉडलों द्वारा आउटपुट असंगत हो सकता है। हम भावना लेबल की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए बहु-कार्य सीखने का उपयोग करते हैं और कई डिकोडर के साथ एक सामान्य एन्कोडर का उपयोग करके दिए गए उच्चारण के लिए एक व्यवहार्य प्रतिक्रिया उत्पन्न करते हैं। हमारे प्रस्तावित एन्कोडर-डिकोडर मॉडल में एक स्व-ध्यान आधारित एन्कोडर और एक निर्दिष्ट भावना के साथ प्रतिक्रिया उत्पन्न करने के लिए डॉट उत्पाद ध्यान तंत्र के साथ एक विकोडक होता है। हम असंतुलित डेटा वितरण को संभालने के लिए फोकल नुकसान का उपयोग करते हैं, और डिकोडर द्वारा सुसंगत डिकोडिंग की अनुमति देने के लिए स्थिरता हानि का उपयोग करते हैं। मानव मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल अधिक भावनात्मक रूप से प्रासंगिक प्रतिक्रियाओं का उत्पादन करता है। इसके अलावा, हमारा मॉडल स्वचालित मूल्यांकन उपायों जैसे F1 और BLEU स्कोर पर कई मजबूत बेसलाइन को मात देता है, इस प्रकार अधिक धाराप्रवाह और पर्याप्त प्रतिक्रियाओं के परिणामस्वरूप होता है।', 'ru': 'Недавней темой исследований в области генерации естественного языка стала разработка модулей автоматического генерации ответов, которые могут автоматически реагировать на высказывания пользователя сопереживающим образом. Предыдущие исследования решали эту задачу с помощью нейрогенерирующих методов, дополняя классы эмоций входными последовательностями. Однако результаты, получаемые с помощью этих моделей, могут быть непоследовательными. Мы используем многозадачное обучение для предсказания ярлыка эмоций и генерирования жизнеспособного ответа для данного высказывания с помощью общего кодера с несколькими декодерами. Предложенная нами модель кодер-декодер состоит из кодера, основанного на самовнимании, и декодера с точечным механизмом внимания продукта для генерации ответа с заданной эмоцией. Мы используем потери фокуса для обработки несбалансированного распределения данных и потери согласованности для обеспечения согласованного декодирования декодерами. Оценка человека показывает, что наша модель дает более эмоционально релевантные ответы. Кроме того, наша модель превосходит многочисленные сильные базовые линии по автоматическим показателям оценки, таким как баллы F1 и BLEU, что приводит к более беглому и адекватному ответу.', 'ga': 'Ábhar taighde le déanaí ar ghiniúint teanga nádúrtha is ea modúil giniúna uathfhreagartha a fhorbairt ar féidir leo freagairt go huathoibríoch do chaint an úsáideora ar bhealach comhbhách. Tá taighde roimhe seo tar éis dul i ngleic leis an tasc seo ag baint úsáide as modhanna giniúna néaracha trí ranganna mothúcháin a mhéadú leis na seichimh ionchuir. D’fhéadfadh na haschuir ó na samhlacha seo a bheith neamh-chomhsheasmhach, áfach. Bainimid úsáid as foghlaim ilthasc chun an lipéad mothúcháin a thuar agus chun freagairt inmharthana a ghiniúint do chaint ar leith ag baint úsáide as ionchódóir coiteann le díchódóirí iolracha. Is éard atá sa tsamhail ionchódóra-díchódóra atá beartaithe againn ná ionchódóir bunaithe ar fhéinaird agus díchódóir le meicníocht aird táirge ponc chun freagairt le mothúchán sonraithe a ghiniúint. Bainimid úsáid as an gcaillteanas fócasach chun dáileadh sonraí neamhchothromaithe a láimhseáil, agus úsáidimid an caillteanas comhsheasmhachta chun díchódú comhleanúnach a cheadú ag na díchódóirí. Léiríonn meastóireacht dhaonna go dtáirgeann ár múnla freagraí níos ábhartha ó thaobh na mothúchán de. Ina theannta sin, sáraíonn ár múnla na bonnlínte láidre iolracha maidir le bearta meastóireachta uathoibríocha amhail scóir F1 agus BLEU, agus mar thoradh air sin tá freagraí níos líofa agus níos leordhóthanacha ann.', 'hu': 'A természetes nyelv generálásával kapcsolatos kutatások egyik legújabb kutatási témája az automatikus válasz generáló modulok fejlesztése volt, amelyek automatikusan empatikusan reagálnak a felhasználó kimondására. Korábbi kutatások ezt a feladatot neurális generációs módszerekkel kezelték, az érzelmi osztályokat a bemeneti szekvenciákkal növelve. Az említett modellek kimenetei azonban következetlenek lehetnek. Többfeladatos tanulást alkalmazunk, hogy megjósoljuk az érzelmi címkét, és életképes választ generáljunk egy adott kimondásra egy közös kódolóval, több dekódolóval. Javasolt kódoló-dekódoló modellünk egy önfigyelem alapú kódolóból és egy pont termék figyelem mechanizmusával ellátott dekódolóból áll, hogy választ generáljon egy adott érzelemmel. A fókuszveszteséget az egyensúlytalan adatforgalom kezelésére használjuk, és a következetességveszteséget használjuk fel, hogy lehetővé tegyük a dekódolók általi koherens dekódolást. Az emberi értékelés azt mutatja, hogy modellünk érzelmileg relevánsabb válaszokat eredményez. Ezenkívül modellünk több erős kiindulási értéket is felülmúlja az automatikus értékelési méréseknél, mint például F1 és BLEU pontszámok, így folyékonyabb és megfelelőbb válaszokat eredményezve.', 'el': 'Ένα πρόσφατο θέμα έρευνας στη δημιουργία φυσικής γλώσσας είναι η ανάπτυξη μονάδων αυτόματης δημιουργίας απόκρισης που μπορούν αυτόματα να ανταποκριθούν στην ομιλία ενός χρήστη με ενσυναίσθητο τρόπο. Προηγούμενη έρευνα έχει αντιμετωπίσει αυτό το έργο χρησιμοποιώντας νευρωνικές παραγωγικές μεθόδους εμπλουτίζοντας τις τάξεις συναισθημάτων με τις ακολουθίες εισόδου. Ωστόσο, τα αποτελέσματα αυτών των μοντέλων ενδέχεται να είναι ασυνεπή. Χρησιμοποιούμε εκμάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών για να προβλέψουμε την ετικέτα συναισθημάτων και να δημιουργήσουμε μια βιώσιμη απάντηση για μια δεδομένη ομιλία χρησιμοποιώντας έναν κοινό κωδικοποιητή με πολλαπλούς αποκωδικοποιητές. Το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή αποτελείται από έναν κωδικοποιητή με βάση την αυτοπροσοχή και έναν αποκωδικοποιητή με μηχανισμό προσοχής προϊόντων σημείων για να δημιουργήσει απόκριση με ένα συγκεκριμένο συναίσθημα. Χρησιμοποιούμε την εστιακή απώλεια για να χειριστούμε την ανισορροπημένη κατανομή δεδομένων, και χρησιμοποιούμε την απώλεια συνέπειας για να επιτρέψουμε τη συνεκτική αποκωδικοποίηση από τους αποκωδικοποιητές. Η ανθρώπινη αξιολόγηση αποκαλύπτει ότι το μοντέλο μας παράγει πιο συναισθηματικά συναφείς απαντήσεις. Επιπλέον, το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά τις πολλαπλές ισχυρές γραμμές βάσης σε αυτόματα μέτρα αξιολόγησης, όπως οι βαθμολογίες F1 και BLEU, με αποτέλεσμα να έχει πιο ομαλή και επαρκή απόκριση.', 'ka': 'მიმდინარე თემა, რომელიც მომხმარებლის გამოსახულების გამოსახულების გამოსახულების გამოსახულების გამოსახულების გამოსახულების გამოსახულების მოდულების განვითარება იყო. წინა შესწავლობა ამ დავალების გამოყენება ნეიროლური გენერაციული მეტოვების გამოყენებით ემოციონის კლასების აღქმენტირებით შესწავლობით. მაგრამ, ეს მოდელების შემდეგ შეიძლება არასწორია. ჩვენ მრავალ დავასწავლობთ, რომ ემოციონის ლებლის წარმოდგენისთვის და გავიქცევთ მხოლოდ განსხვავებელი პასუხისთვის, რომელიც გამოყენებული მრავალ კოდერის გამოყენებ ჩვენი პროგრამის რეკოდერების მოდელი იქნება თავიდან აღმოჩენებული კოდერების და რეკოდერების შესახებ პროგრამის აღმოჩენების მექანსი, რომელიც განსაზღვრებული ემოციებით რეაქტის შე ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ფოკოლური დაკავშირების განმავლობაში მონაცემების განმავლობაში, და გამოყენებთ კონსტენსტის დაკავშირების დაკავშირება, რომ კონსტენტის განმავლ ადამიანის განსაზღვრება აღმოჩნდება, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი უფრო ემოციონალურად მნიშვნელოვანი პასუხი გამოყენებს. დამატებით, ჩვენი მოდელი უფრო ძალიან ძალიან ბაზი ხაზების გამოყენება, როგორც F1 და BLEU ხაზების მონაცემებზე, ამიტომ შეიძლება უფრო ძალიან და უფრო ძალიან განსხვავება.', 'it': "Un recente argomento di ricerca nella generazione del linguaggio naturale è stato lo sviluppo di moduli di generazione automatica di risposta che possono rispondere automaticamente alle parole di un utente in modo empatico. Le ricerche precedenti hanno affrontato questo compito utilizzando metodi generativi neurali aumentando le classi emotive con le sequenze di input. Tuttavia, le uscite di questi modelli possono essere incoerenti. Impieghiamo l'apprendimento multi-task per prevedere l'etichetta emotiva e per generare una risposta valida per una data pronuncia utilizzando un encoder comune con decoder multipli. Il nostro modello encoder-decoder proposto consiste in un encoder basato sull'auto-attenzione e un decoder con meccanismo di attenzione del prodotto dot per generare risposta con un'emozione specifica. Usiamo la perdita focale per gestire la distribuzione dei dati sbilanciata e utilizziamo la perdita di coerenza per consentire una decodifica coerente da parte dei decoder. La valutazione umana rivela che il nostro modello produce risposte più emotivamente pertinenti. Inoltre, il nostro modello supera molteplici linee di base forti su misure di valutazione automatiche come i punteggi F1 e BLEU, risultando così in risposte più fluenti e adeguate.", 'lt': 'Naujausia gamtos kalbų kūrimo mokslinių tyrimų tema buvo automatinio atsako generavimo modulių, kurie gali automatiškai reaguoti į naudotojo pareiškimą empatiškai, kūrimas. Previous research has tackled this task using neural generative methods by augmenting emotion classes with the input sequences.  However, the outputs by these models may be inconsistent.  Mes naudojame daugelį užduočių mokymąsi, kad nuspėtume emocijų ženklą ir sukurtume gyvybingą atsaką tam tikram išraiškam naudojant bendrą kodą su daugeliu dekoderių. Mūsų siūlomas koduotojo dekoderio modelis yra savarankiškas koduotojas ir dekoderis su taškų produktų dėmesio mechanizmu, kad būtų sukurtas atsakas su konkrečia emocija. Naudojame pagrindinius nuostolius, kad išspręstume nesubalansuotą duomenų paskirstymą, ir nuoseklumo nuostolius, kad dekoderiai galėtų nuosekliai dekoduoti. Žmogaus vertinimas rodo, kad mūsų modelis sukuria labiau emocionaliai aktualius atsakus. Be to, mūsų modelis yra didesnis už daugelį tvirtų automatinių vertinimo priemonių, pavyzdžiui, F1 ir BLEU rezultatų, pagrindų, todėl reaguojama lanksčiau ir tinkamai.', 'mk': 'Неодамнешната тема на истражување во генерацијата на природни јазици беше развојот на модули за генерација автоматски одговор кои можат автоматски да одговараат на изразот на корисникот на емпатичен начин. Претходното истражување ја реши оваа задача користејќи нервни генеративни методи со зголемување на часовите на емоции со вводните секвенци. However, the outputs by these models may be inconsistent.  Ние употребуваме мултизадачно учење за да ја предвидеме емоционалната етикета и да генерираме жив одговор за одреден израз користејќи заеднички кодер со повеќе декодери. Нашиот предложен модел на кодер-декодер се состои од кодер базиран на себе внимание и декодер со механизам на внимание на точките производи за генерирање одговор со одредена емоција. Ние ја користиме фокалната загуба за да се справиме со небалансираната дистрибуција на податоци, и да ја искористиме загубата на констенцијата за да дозволиме кохерентно декодирање од декодерите. Човечката проценка открива дека нашиот модел произведува поемоционално поврзани одговори. In addition, our model outperforms multiple strong baselines on automatic evaluation measures such as F1 and BLEU scores, thus resulting in more fluent and adequate responses.', 'ms': 'Topik kajian baru-baru ini dalam generasi bahasa semulajadi telah menjadi pembangunan modul generasi balas automatik yang boleh secara automatik menjawab kepada ungkapan pengguna dengan cara empati. Penelitian terdahulu telah mengatasi tugas ini menggunakan kaedah generasi saraf dengan menambah kelas emosi dengan urutan input. Namun, output dari model ini mungkin tidak konsisten. Kami menggunakan pembelajaran berbilang-tugas untuk meramalkan label emosi dan untuk menghasilkan balasan yang mudah untuk perkataan tertentu menggunakan pengekod umum dengan pengekod berbilang. Our proposed encoder-decoder model consists of a self-attention based encoder and a decoder with dot product attention mechanism to generate response with a specified emotion.  We use the focal loss to handle imbalanced data distribution, and utilize the consistency loss to allow coherent decoding by the decoders.  Evaluasi manusia menunjukkan bahawa model kita menghasilkan respon yang lebih sesuai emosional. Selain itu, model kita melampaui garis dasar yang kuat berbilang pada tindakan penilaian automatik seperti skor F1 dan BLEU, sehingga menghasilkan balasan yang lebih mudah dan sesuai.', 'kk': 'Табиғи тілдер құрылғандағы зерттеулердің жаңа нақышы автоматты жауап беру модульдерінің жасауы болды. Бұл пайдаланушының сөздеріне автоматты түрде эмпатикалық түрде жауап бере алады. Алдыңғы зерттеу бұл тапсырманы невралдық генерациялық әдістерді келтіру ретінде эмоциялық классияларды көтеру арқылы түсіндіреді. Бірақ бұл үлгілердің шығысы қарамсыз болуы мүмкін. Біз көптеген тапсырмаларды көптеген оқыту үшін емоциялық жарлығын алдын алатын және көптеген декодерлерді қолдану үшін келтірілген сөйлеу үшін көптеген жауап беру үшін ж Біздің қолданылатын кодер- декодер үлгісіміз өзімізге негізделген кодер мен декодер деңгейіміз келтірілген емоциялармен жауап беру үшін нүктелген продуктты қарау механизмі болады Біз бағытталған деректерді үлестіру үшін тоғыс жоғалуын қолданып, декодерлердің координативті координату үшін тәуелсіздік жоғалуын қолданамыз. Адам оқу үлгіміздің емоциялық жауаптарды жасайтынын көрсетеді. Қосымша, біздің үлгіміз F1 және BLEU нәтижелері секілді автоматты оқу мерзімдерінде бірнеше күшті негізгі сызықтарды өзгертеді, сондықтан бұл нәтижелерді жауап береді.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവ ഭാഷയുടെ തലമുറയില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ അടുത്തുള്ള ഒരു വിഷയം സ്വയം പ്രതികരിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രവർത്തികമായ പ്രവർത്തനങ് ന്യൂറല്\u200d ജനററിവ് രീതികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് മുമ്പുള്ള പഠനത്തില്\u200d ഈ ജോലിയെ പരിശോധിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് സെക്കന്\u200dസ എന്നാലും ഈ മോഡലുകളുടെ പുറത്തുള്ള പുറത്തുള്ള പ്രവർത്തനങ്ങളൊക്കെ അസാധ്യതയില്ല. ഒരു പൊതുവാക്ക് കൊടുത്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഒരു സാധാരണ കോഡെര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഒരു സാധാരണ കോഡെര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടി ഞങ്ങള നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട കോഡോര്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d സ്വയം ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു കോഡോര്\u200dഡും പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു  നമ്മുടെ ഫോക്കല്\u200d നഷ്ടത്തെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് അസാധുവായ ഡേറ്റാ വിതരണ കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന് മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിലാസപ്രകാരം നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വിചാരപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ഉത്തരം ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അതുകൂടാതെ, നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d സ്വയം നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രകൃതികളില്\u200d പല ശക്തിയുള്ള ബേസ്ലൈനുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. F1, ബില', 'mt': 'Suġġett riċenti ta’ riċerka fil-ġenerazzjoni tal-lingwi naturali kien l-iżvilupp ta’ moduli ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ rispons awtomatiku li jistgħu jirrispondu awtomatikament għall-espressjoni ta’ utent b’mod empatiku. Ir-riċerka preċedenti indirizzat dan il-kompitu bl-użu ta’ metodi ġenerattivi newrali billi żiedet il-klassijiet emozzjonali bis-sekwenzi ta’ input. Madankollu, ir-riżultati minn dawn il-mudelli jistgħu jkunu inkonsistenti. Aħna nużaw tagħlim multikompiti biex nipprojbixxu t-tikketta emozzjonali u biex niġġeneraw rispons vijabbli għal espressjoni partikolari bl-użu ta’ kodifikatur komuni b’diversi dekoders. Il-mudell ta’ kodifikatur-dekoder propost tagħna jikkonsisti f’kodifikatur ibbażat fuq l-awtonomija u dekoder b’mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni tal-prodott b’punti biex jiġġenera rispons b’emozzjoni speċifikata. Aħna nużaw it-telf fokali biex nimmaniġġjaw id-distribuzzjoni żbilanċjata tad-dejta, u nużaw it-telf ta’ konsistenza biex jippermettu dekodifikazzjoni koerenti mid-dekodifikaturi. L-evalwazzjoni tal-bniedem turi li l-mudell tagħna jipproduċi reazzjonijiet aktar emozzjonalment pertinenti. Barra minn hekk, il-mudell tagħna jaqbeż diversi linji bażi b’saħħithom dwar miżuri ta’ evalwazzjoni awtomatiċi bħall-punteġġi F1 u BLEU, u b’hekk jirriżulta f’reazzjonijiet aktar fluwenti u adegwati.', 'pl': 'Ostatnim tematem badań nad generowaniem języka naturalnego jest opracowanie modułów automatycznego generowania odpowiedzi, które mogą automatycznie reagować na wypowiedzi użytkownika w sposób empatyczny. Poprzednie badania podjęły to zadanie za pomocą neuronowych metod generacyjnych poprzez rozszerzenie klas emocji o sekwencje wejściowe. Jednakże wyniki tych modeli mogą być niespójne. Wykorzystujemy wielozadaniowe uczenie się, aby przewidzieć etykietę emocji i generować realną reakcję na daną wypowiedź za pomocą wspólnego kodera z wieloma dekoderami. Nasz proponowany model kodera-dekodera składa się z kodera opartego na własnej uwadze oraz dekodera z mechanizmem uwagi produktu kropkowego w celu generowania odpowiedzi z określoną emocją. Używamy straty ogniskowej do obsługi niezrównoważonej dystrybucji danych i wykorzystujemy utratę spójności, aby umożliwić spójne dekodowanie przez dekodery. Ocena ludzka ujawnia, że nasz model wytwarza bardziej istotne emocjonalnie reakcje. Ponadto nasz model przewyższa wiele silnych linii bazowych w zakresie automatycznych mierzeń oceny, takich jak wyniki F1 i BLEU, co skutkuje bardziej płynnymi i adekwatnymi reakcjami.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл төрөлхтний судалгааны сүүлийн сэдэв нь хэрэглэгчийн ярианд автоматжуулан хариу үйлдэл гаргах модульуудын хөгжүүлэлт юм. Өмнөх судалгаа үүнийг мэдрэлийн үйлдвэрлэлийн арга ашиглан мэдрэлийн хичээлийг орж ирсэн дарааллаар нэмэгдүүлсэн. Гэвч эдгээр загварын үр дүн нь бус байж магадгүй. Бид сэтгэл хөдлөлийн жагсаалтыг таамаглахад олон ажлын сургалтыг ашиглаж, олон хэлбэртэй нийгмийн коддогч ашиглах боломжтой хариулт гаргах хэрэгтэй. Бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн коддогч загвар нь өөртөө анхаарлаа хандуулсан коддогч болон цэг бүтээгдэхүүний анхаарлаа хандуулах механизм юм. Бид тооны алдагдлыг ашиглаж өгөгдлийн хуваарилалтыг зохицуулахын тулд хэрэглэдэг. Мөн тэмдэглэгчид холбогдолтой хуваарилалтыг ашигладаг. Хүн төрөлхтний дүгнэлт нь бидний загвар сэтгэл хөдлөл сэтгэл хөдлөлтэй хариу үйлдвэрлэж байна. Мөн бидний загвар нь F1 болон BLEU оноо зэрэг автоматжуулалтын үндсэн хэмжээсүүд дээр олон хүчтэй суурь шугам гаргадаг. Иймээс илүү шингэн, адилхан хариулт гаргадаг.', 'no': 'Ein nyleg emne på forskning i naturspråk-generering er utviklinga av automatiske modular for oppretting av svar som kan automatisk svara på eit brukarstale på ein empatisk måte. Førre forskning har løyst denne oppgåva ved å bruka neuralgenerativ metodar ved å auka emosjonsklasser med inndata-sekvensane. Utdata av desse modelane kan imidlertid vera inkonsistent. Vi brukar fleire oppgåver for å forhåndsvisa følelsesmerket og for å laga ein leveraktig svar for eit gitt uttrykk med ein felles koder med fleire dekoder. Vår foreslått koderingsmodell inneheld ein selvmerksomsetjingsbasert koder og ein dekoder med punktproduktoppmerksmekanisme for å laga svar med ein spesifisert følelse. Vi bruker fokaltapen for å handtera ulike datadistribusjon, og bruker tap av konsistensiteten for å tillata koherent dekoding av dekoderane. Menneske evalueringa viser at modellen vårt produserer meir emosjonelle svar. I tillegg vil modellen vårt utføre fleire sterke baselinjer på automatiske evalueringsmålar, som F1 og BLEU-poeng, slik at resultater i meir flukt og tilgjengelege svar.', 'ro': 'Un subiect recent de cercetare în generarea limbajului natural a fost dezvoltarea de module automate de generare a răspunsului care pot răspunde automat la cuvântul unui utilizator într-o manieră empatică. Cercetările anterioare au abordat această sarcină folosind metode generative neurale prin mărirea claselor emoționale cu secvențele de intrare. Cu toate acestea, rezultatele acestor modele pot fi inconsecvente. Folosim învățarea multi-task pentru a prezice eticheta emoțională și pentru a genera un răspuns viabil pentru o anumită pronunțare folosind un codificator comun cu mai multe decodoare. Modelul nostru propus de encoder-decoder constă dintr-un encoder bazat pe auto-atenție și un decoder cu mecanism de atenție a produsului punct pentru a genera răspuns cu o emoție specificată. Folosim pierderea focală pentru a gestiona distribuirea dezechilibrată a datelor și utilizăm pierderea consistenței pentru a permite decodarea coerentă de către decodoare. Evaluarea umană arată că modelul nostru produce răspunsuri mai pertinente din punct de vedere emoțional. În plus, modelul nostru depășește mai multe linii de bază puternice pe măsurile automate de evaluare, cum ar fi scorurile F1 și BLEU, rezultând astfel în răspunsuri mai fluente și adecvate.', 'so': 'Dhab ahaan baaritaanka qarniga afka dabiicadda ah ayaa ah horumarinta qaabilaada iskumar ah, kaas oo si bilowgiis ah ugu jawaabi kara hadalka isticmaalaha si caafimaad ah. Baaritaankii hore ayaa shaqadan ku tacliiyey isticmaalka qaababka neuro-dhalashada, waxayna ku kordhisay fasalka emotion-fasalka midibka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa laga yaabaa in tusaalahan ay soo baxaan mid aan isku mid ahayn. Waxaynu shaqaynaynaa waxbarasho badan si aan u sii sheegno calaamada hissiga iyo inaan u sameyno jawaab u leh hadal la siiyo oo lagu isticmaalo cod caadi ah oo ay leeyihiin kooban. Tusaalkayaga la soo jeeday codcodcodsiga waxaa ka mid ah cod aad u taxadaraysan lahayd iskuul-hoosaysiinta iyo qodolk oo haysta meyminimo dhaqaalaha ah si ay ugu soo jawaabo fikrada la qoray. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa khasaaraha focal si aan u xambaarano qaybinta macluumaadka aan la simin karin, waxaynu isticmaalnaa khasaarada joogtada ah si aan u fasaxno kooxda codsiga. Qiimeynta biniaadamka waxay muuqataa in modellkayagu uu soo bixiyo jawaabo farxad badan oo ku saabsan. Sidoo kale modellkayaga ayaa ka soo saara saldhigyo xoog badan oo ku saabsan qiyaastii maamaamulka ah, sida qiimeynta F1 iyo BLEU scorihiisa, waxaana sababtay jawaabo dheer oo ku filan.', 'sv': 'Ett nyligen forskningsämne inom generering av naturligt språk har varit utvecklingen av automatiska svarsgenereringsmoduler som automatiskt kan svara på en användares uttalande på ett empatiskt sätt. Tidigare forskning har tagit itu med denna uppgift med neurala generativa metoder genom att utöka känsloklasserna med inmatningssekvenserna. Resultaten från dessa modeller kan dock vara inkonsekventa. Vi använder multi-task lärande för att förutsäga känslomärkningen och för att generera ett livskraftigt svar för en given yttring med hjälp av en gemensam kodare med flera avkodare. Vår föreslagna encoder-dekoder modell består av en självuppmärksamhetsbaserad encoder och en dekoder med punktproduktens uppmärksamhetsmekanism för att generera respons med en specificerad känsla. Vi använder fokalförlusten för att hantera obalanserad datadistribution, och använder konsekvensförlusten för att möjliggöra konsekvent avkodning av dekodrarna. Mänsklig utvärdering visar att vår modell ger mer känslomässigt relevanta svar. Dessutom överträffar vår modell flera starka baslinjer på automatiska utvärderingsåtgärder som F1 och BLEU-poäng, vilket resulterar i mer flytande och adekvata svar.', 'sr': 'Nedavna tema istraživanja u generaciji prirodnog jezika bila je razvoj modula generacije automatskih odgovora koji mogu automatski odgovoriti na govor korisnika na empatičan način. Prethodno istraživanje je riješilo ovaj zadatak koristeći neuralne generativne metode povećanjem časova emocija sa ulaznim sekvencijama. Međutim, rezultati ovih modela mogu biti nepristojni. Mi zapošljavamo učenje više zadataka kako bi predvidjeli etiketu emocija i stvorili održivi odgovor na određeno rečenje koristeći zajednički koder sa višestrukim dekoderima. Naš predloženi model kodera-dekodera se sastoji od kodera na samopouzdanju i dekodera sa mehanizam pažnje to čkog proizvoda da bi stvorio odgovor sa određenim emocijama. Koristimo fokusni gubitak kako bi se bavili distribucijom podataka, i iskoristili gubitak konsekvencije kako bi omogućili saslušnu dekodiranje dekodiranja. Ljudska procjena pokazuje da naš model proizvodi emocionalnije odgovore. Osim toga, naš model iznosi višestruke jake osnovne linije na automatskim mjerama procjene kao što su F1 i BLEU rezultati, što rezultira tečnijim i odgovarajućim odgovorima.', 'si': 'ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරභාවිත විදියට පරීක්ෂණය ගැන අලුත් විදියට ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාව ප්\u200dරභාවිත විදියට ප මුලින් පරීක්ෂණය කලින් මේ ව්\u200dයාපෘතිය ප්\u200dරභාවිත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dය නමුත්, මේ මොඩේල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නැති වෙන්න පුළුවන්. අපි ගොඩක් වැඩක් වැඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න හැඟීම් ලේබල් විශ්වාස කරන්න සහ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සාමාන්\u200dය සංකේතකයෙක් විතරයි. අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ කෝඩර් ඩිකෝඩර් මොඩල් එක්ක ස්වාම්ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අධික අවධානයක් සහ ඩිකෝඩර් එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ් අපි පාවිච්චි නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ නිර්මාණ දත්ත විතරය සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය නිර්මාණය සඳහා පාවිච්චි කරන්න,  මිනිස්සු විශ්ලේෂණය ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා අපේ නිර්මාණය තව ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා. ඒ වගේම, අපේ මෝඩේල් වලින් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්වාස කරන්නේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්වාස කරන්න බොහොම බලාපොරොත්තු ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් වගේ', 'ur': 'طبیعی زبان کی نسل میں تحقیقات کی اخیر موضوع کی تغییر اتماٹی جواب دینے کی موڈولوں کی تغییر ہے جو استعمال کی بات کو اپنا اتماٹی طریقہ سے جواب دیں۔ پہلے کی تحقیقات نے اس کام کو نئورل پیدا کرنے والے طریقے کے مطابق مصنوعی کلاس کے ساتھ اضافہ کردیا ہے۔ اگرچہ، یہ مدل کے نتائج ممکن ہے ناپاکیزہ ہوں۔ ہم بہت سے کام کی تعلیم کرتے ہیں کہ احساس لیبل کو پیش بینی کریں اور ایک دیے ہوئے کلام کے لئے ایک قابل جواب پیدا کریں اور بہت سے ڈاکوڈر کے ساتھ ایک عامل کوڈر کا استعمال کریں. ہماری پیشنهاد کی کوڈر-ڈیکوڈر موڈل ایک اپنا ذهن بنیاد رکھنے والی کوڈر اور ایک ڈاکوڈر ڈاکوڈر کے ذریعہ سے دکھانے والی مکانیسم ہے کہ ایک مشخص احساس کے ساتھ جواب پیدا کرے۔ ہم فوکال خسارہ کا استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ نابرانگیز ڈیٹا تقسیم کرنے کے لئے اور اتنی خسارہ کا استعمال کریں کہ دکوڈر کے ذریعے اتنی دکوڈ کرنے کی اجازت دے۔ انسان کا ارزیابی ظاہر کرتا ہے کہ ہماری مدل اس سے زیادہ احساساتی اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ اس کے علاوہ ہماری مدل نے آٹوٹی ارزیابی مطابق زیادہ طاقتور بنسٹ لینوں کو اضافہ کرتا ہے جیسے F1 اور BLEU اسکور، اس کے نتیجہ میں بہت سیدھی اور مناسب جواب دیتا ہے.', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழி உருவாக்கத்தில் ஒரு சமீபத்தில் ஆராய்ச்சியின் தலைப்பு தானியங்கி பதில் உருவாக்கும் கூறுகளை உருவாக்கும் பொருள் தா முந்தைய ஆராய்ச்சி இந்த செயல்பாட்டை உள்ளீடு வரிசைகளுடன் சேர்த்து உணர்வு வகுப்புகளை கூட்டுதலால் புதிய பொதுவான ம ஆனால், இந்த மாதிரிகளின் வெளியீடுகள் பொருத்தமாக இருக்கலாம். We employ multi-task learning to predict the emotion label and to generate a viable response for a given utterance using a common encoder with multiple decoders.  எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட குறிமுறையாக்கி மாதிரி ஒரு தானே கவனத்தை அடிப்படையான குறியீடு மற்றும் ஒரு புள்ளியீட்டு புள்ளியின் கவ நாம் ஒழுங்குமில்லாத தரவு பங்கீட்டை கையாள குறியீட்டை பயன்படுத்தி தொடர்ந்த இழப்பை பயன்படுத்தி குறியீட்டு குறியீட்ட Human evaluation reveals that our model produces more emotionally pertinent responses.  மேலும், எங்கள் மாதிரி தானியங்கி மதிப்பின் முறைகளில் பல வலிமையான அடிப்படைகளை செயல்படுத்துகிறது, F1 மற்றும் பிலியு மதிப்புகள் போன்ற, அதனால்', 'uz': "Taʼminlovchi tilning asl generalida taʼminlovchi mavzusi avtomatik javob yaratish modullarini yaratish mumkin, bu foydalanuvchining so'zlariga avtomatik javob berishi mumkin. Oldingi taʼminot, bu vazifani kiritish chegaralari bilan birlashtirish uchun neyural generativ usullar bilan ishlab chiqaradi. Lekin, bu modellarning natijalari muvaffaqiyatli bo'lishi mumkin. Biz bir necha xil kodlash yordamida foydalanuvchi muloqat vazifani o'rganamiz Bizning pendilgan koddekoder modeli o'z o'zimga asosiy kodlash imkoniyatini va xususiyatli hisob bilan javob yaratish uchun dot taʼminlovchi mechaniyatlarni yaratish mumkin. Biz balandlik maʼlumot tarqatishni boshqarish uchun fokal yozuvdan foydalanamiz va davom etish uchun davom etishni foydalanamiz. Inson qiymatlarimiz modelimiz juda hissiyotni o'zgartiradi. Ko'pchilik, bizning modelimiz bir necha sterk asosiy asboblarni avtomatik qiymatlashni o'zgartiradi, F1 va BLEU scorlarini kamaytirish imkoniyatini bajaradi. Bu sababda ko'proq javoblar va yetarli javob beradi.", 'vi': 'Một chủ đề nghiên cứu gần đây trong thế hệ ngôn ngữ tự nhiên đã được phát triển các mô- đun ứng dụng tự động có thể tự động đáp ứng lời nói của người dùng theo một cách cảm thông. Nghiên cứu trước đã giải quyết việc này bằng phương pháp tạo hóa thần kinh bằng cách tăng lớp cảm xúc với các chuỗi nhập. Tuy nhiên, kết xuất của những mẫu này có thể bất đồng. Chúng tôi sử dụng việc học nhiều nhiệm vụ dự đoán nhãn hiệu cảm xúc và tạo ra một phản ứng có thể sử dụng một lời phát biểu thông thường với nhiều bộ giải mã. Mẫu mã hóa đề nghị của chúng ta gồm một bộ mã hóa có căn cứ riêng tư và một bộ giải mã có cơ chế tập trung sản để tạo phản ứng với cảm xúc đã xác định. Chúng tôi sử dụng tiêu cự để xử lý việc phân phối dữ liệu thiếu cân bằng, và sử dụng sự mất cân bằng để có thể giải mã phù hợp. Bài đánh giá của con người cho thấy mẫu của chúng ta có những phản ứng thích đáng. Hơn nữa, mô hình của chúng ta hoàn thành nhiều cơ sở cơ bản vững chắc về các biện pháp đánh giá tự động như F1 và bắn hạ đại liên tục, kết quả có nhiều cách đáp ứng thông thạo và thích đáng hơn.', 'bg': 'Неотдавнашна тема за изследване на генерирането на естествен език е разработването на модули за генериране на автоматичен отговор, които могат автоматично да отговорят на изказването на потребителя по съпричастен начин. Предишни изследвания са разгледали тази задача с помощта на невронни генеративни методи чрез увеличаване на емоционалните класове с входните последователности. Резултатите от тези модели обаче могат да бъдат несъвместими. Използваме многофункционално обучение, за да предвидим етикета на емоциите и да генерираме жизнеспособен отговор за дадена реч, използвайки общ кодер с множество декодери. Предлаганият ни модел енкодер-декодер се състои от енкодер базиран на самовнимание и декодер с точков механизъм за внимание на продукта, който генерира отговор с определена емоция. Използваме фокусната загуба за справяне с дисбалансирано разпределение на данни и използваме загубата на консистенция, за да позволим съгласувано декодиране от декодерите. Човешката оценка разкрива, че нашият модел произвежда по-емоционално уместни отговори. В допълнение, нашият модел превъзхожда множество силни базови линии при автоматични мерки за оценка, като резултат от това е по-плавен и адекватен отговор.', 'nl': 'Een recent onderwerp van onderzoek naar natuurlijke taalgeneratie is de ontwikkeling van automatische responsgeneratie modules die automatisch op een empathische manier kunnen reageren op de uitspraak van een gebruiker. Eerder onderzoek heeft deze taak aangepakt met behulp van neurale generatieve methoden door emotieklassen uit te breiden met de invoersequenties. De outputs van deze modellen kunnen echter inconsistent zijn. We gebruiken multi-task learning om het emotielabel te voorspellen en een haalbare respons te genereren voor een bepaalde uiting met behulp van een gemeenschappelijke encoder met meerdere decoders. Ons voorgestelde encoder-decoder model bestaat uit een op eigen aandacht gebaseerde encoder en een decoder met puntproduct aandachtsmechanisme om respons te genereren met een bepaalde emotie. We gebruiken het brandpuntsverlies om onevenwichtige gegevensdistributie aan te pakken, en gebruiken het consistentieverlies om coherente decodering door de decoders mogelijk te maken. Menselijke evaluatie laat zien dat ons model emotioneel relevantere reacties produceert. Bovendien overtreft ons model meerdere sterke baselines op automatische evaluatiemaatregelen zoals F1- en BLEU-scores, wat resulteert in vloeiendere en adequatere reacties.', 'da': 'Et nyligt forskningsemne inden for generering af natursprog har været udviklingen af automatiske responsgenereringsmoduler, der automatisk kan reagere på en brugers udtalelse på en empatisk måde. Tidligere forskning har tacklet denne opgave ved hjælp af neurale generative metoder ved at øge følelsesklasser med input sekvenser. Disse modellers output kan imidlertid være inkonsekvent. Vi anvender multi-task læring til at forudsige følelsesmærket og generere et levedygtigt svar for en given udtalelse ved hjælp af en fælles encoder med flere dekodere. Vores foreslåede encoder-dekoder model består af en selvopmærksomhedsbaseret encoder og en dekoder med dot produkt opmærksomhedsmekanisme til at generere respons med en bestemt følelse. Vi bruger fokaltabet til at håndtere ubalanceret datadistribution, og udnytter konsistenstabet til at muliggøre sammenhængende afkodning af dekoderne. Menneskelig evaluering afslører, at vores model producerer mere følelsesmæssigt relevante reaktioner. Desuden overgår vores model flere stærke basislinjer på automatiske evalueringsforanstaltninger som F1 og BLEU scores, hvilket resulterer i mere flydende og tilstrækkelige svar.', 'hr': 'Nedavna tema istraživanja u generaciji prirodnog jezika bila je razvoj modula generacije automatskih odgovora koji mogu automatski odgovoriti na izraz korisnika na empatički način. Prije istraživanja riješila je ovaj zadatak koristeći neuralne generativne metode povećanjem časova emocija sa ulaznim sekvencijama. Međutim, rezultati ovih modela mogu biti nepristojni. Koristimo učenje više zadataka kako bi predvidjeli etiketu emocija i stvorili održivi odgovor na određenu govor koristeći zajednički koder sa višestrukim dekoderima. Naš predloženi model kodera-dekodera sastoji se od kodera koji se temelji na samopouzdanju i dekodera s mehanizam pažnje to čkog proizvoda kako bi stvorio odgovor s određenim emocijama. Koristimo gubitak fokusa kako bi se bavili distribucijom nepravilnih podataka, i iskoristili gubitak konsekvencije kako bi omogućili saslušnu dekodiranje dekodiranja. Ljudska procjena pokazuje da naš model proizvodi emocionalnije odgovore. Osim toga, naš model iznosi višestruke jake osnovne linije na mjerama automatske procjene poput rezultata F1 i BLEU-a, što rezultira tečnijim i odgovarajućim odgovorima.', 'ko': '자연 언어 생성 분야의 최근 연구 주제는 자동 응답 생성 모듈을 개발하는 것이다. 이 모듈은 이정의 방식으로 사용자의 말에 자동으로 응답할 수 있다.이전의 연구는 이미 신경 생성 방법을 사용하여 입력 서열을 통해 감정류를 증가시켜 이 문제를 해결했다.그러나 이러한 모델의 출력은 일치하지 않을 수 있습니다.우리는 다중 임무 학습을 사용하여 감정 라벨을 예측하고, 여러 개의 디코더를 가진 유니버설 인코더를 사용하여 주어진 말에 실행 가능한 응답을 생성합니다.우리가 제시한 인코더 - 디코더 모델은 자기 주의를 바탕으로 하는 인코더와 점적 주의 메커니즘을 가진 디코더로 구성되어 특정한 정서적 응답을 발생시킨다.우리는 초점 손실을 사용하여 불균형한 데이터 분포를 처리하고 일치성 손실을 이용하여 디코더를 상간 디코더로 허용한다.인류의 평가에 따르면 우리의 모델은 더욱 감정적 관련성을 지닌 반응을 일으켰다.또한 Google 모델은 F1과 BLEU 점수와 같은 자동 평가 지표에서 여러 개의 강력한 기준선보다 우수하여 더욱 원활하고 충분한 호응을 얻습니다.', 'fa': 'موضوع اخیر تحقیقات در نسل زبان طبیعی توسعه مدول\u200cهای نسل پاسخ\u200cدهنده\u200cی خودکار بوده است که می\u200cتواند به سخن\u200cدهنده\u200cی یک کاربر به طریق تشویق دهد. تحقیقات قبلی این کار را با استفاده از روش\u200cهای تولید عصبی با افزایش کلاس\u200cهای احساسات با رده\u200cهای ورودی حل کرده است. ولی نتیجه\u200cهای این مدل\u200cها ممکن است ناپایدار باشند. ما از یادگیری بسیاری از کارها استفاده می کنیم تا نقاشی احساسات را پیش بینی کنیم و واکنش قابل قابل قابل تولید برای گفتن داده شده با استفاده از یک کوردر مشترک با دکوردر چندین است. مدل\u200cهای پیشنهاد\u200cشده\u200cای که رمزگذاری\u200cکننده\u200cی رمزگذاری\u200cکننده\u200cی رمزگذاری\u200cکننده\u200cی رمزگذاری\u200cکننده\u200cی رمزگذاری\u200cکننده\u200cای از یک رمزگذاری بر اساس توجه خود و یک رمزگذاری با مکانیسم توجه\u200c ما از خسارت مرکز استفاده می کنیم تا تقسیم داده های نابرابری را کنترل کنیم، و از خسارت اتفاقی استفاده کنیم تا اجازه دهنده های نابرابری را اجازه دهیم. ارزیابی انسان نشان می دهد که مدل ما جواب های احساساتی بیشتری را تولید می کند. علاوه بر این، مدل ما بیشتر از خطوط پایه\u200cهای قوی بر مقدار ارزیابی خودکار مثل امتیاز F1 و BLEU انجام می\u200cدهد، به نتیجه پاسخ\u200cهای سیاه\u200cتری و مناسب\u200cتری می\u200cرسد.', 'id': 'Sebuah topik penelitian baru-baru ini dalam generasi bahasa alam telah mengembangkan modul generasi respon otomatis yang dapat secara otomatis merespon kepada ucapan pengguna dengan cara empati. Penelitian sebelumnya telah mengatasi tugas ini menggunakan metode generasi saraf dengan meningkatkan kelas emosi dengan urutan input. Namun, hasil dari model ini mungkin tidak konsisten. Kami menggunakan belajar multi-tugas untuk memprediksi label emosi dan untuk menghasilkan respon yang rentan untuk sebuah ucapan tertentu menggunakan pengekode umum dengan beberapa dekoder. Model koder-dekoder kami yang diusulkan terdiri dari koder berdasarkan perhatian sendiri dan dekoder dengan mekanisme perhatian produk titik untuk menghasilkan respon dengan emosi tertentu. Kami menggunakan kerugian fokus untuk menangani distribusi data yang tidak seimbang, dan menggunakan kerugian konsistensi untuk memungkinkan dekoding konsisten oleh dekoding. Evaluasi manusia mengungkapkan bahwa model kita menghasilkan respon yang lebih emosional pertinent. In addition, our model outperforms multiple strong baselines on automatic evaluation measures such as F1 and BLEU scores, thus resulting in more fluent and adequate responses.', 'de': 'Ein aktuelles Forschungsthema im Bereich der Erzeugung natürlicher Sprache ist die Entwicklung von automatischen Antwortgenerierungsmodulen, die automatisch empathisch auf die Äußerung eines Benutzers reagieren können. Bisherige Forschungen haben diese Aufgabe mit neural generativen Methoden angegangen, indem Emotionsklassen um die Eingabesequenzen erweitert wurden. Die Ergebnisse dieser Modelle können jedoch inkonsistent sein. Wir verwenden Multi-Task-Learning, um das Emotionslabel vorherzusagen und eine tragfähige Antwort für eine bestimmte Äußerung mithilfe eines gemeinsamen Encoders mit mehreren Decodern zu generieren. Unser vorgeschlagenes Encoder-Decoder-Modell besteht aus einem selbstaufmerksamkeitsbasierten Encoder und einem Decoder mit Punktaufmerksamkeitsmechanismus, um eine Reaktion mit einer bestimmten Emotion zu erzeugen. Wir verwenden den Fokusverlust, um eine ungleichmäßige Datenverteilung zu handhaben, und verwenden den Konsistenzverlust, um eine kohärente Dekodierung durch die Decoder zu ermöglichen. Die menschliche Bewertung zeigt, dass unser Modell emotional relevantere Antworten liefert. Darüber hinaus übertrifft unser Modell mehrere starke Baselines bei automatischen Auswertungsmaßnahmen wie F1- und BLEU-Scores, was zu flüssigeren und adäquateren Antworten führt.', 'sw': 'Mada ya hivi karibuni ya utafiti katika kizazi cha lugha asili imekuwa ni maendeleo ya vifaa vya kujibu binafsi ambavyo vinaweza kujibu hotuba ya mtumiaji kwa namna yenye uchumi. Utafiti uliopita umejikuta na jukumu hili kwa kutumia mbinu za jenerali za neura kwa kuongeza darasa la hisia kwa mfululizo wa input. Hata hivyo, matokeo yanayotokana na mifano hii yanaweza kuwa yasiyo na maana. Tunajiri kujifunza kwa kazi nyingi kutabiri alama ya hisia na kutengeneza jibu linalowezekana kwa ajili ya hotuba iliyotumiwa kwa kutumia kodi ya kawaida yenye decodi mbalimbali. Mradi wetu unapendekezwa wa kodi unajumuisha kodi inayojihusisha na mfumo wa kuandika kwa kujitazama na mfumo wa kutoa vifaa vya kutoa maoni ili kutengeneza jibu kwa hisia maalum. Tunatumia hasara ya kifo ili kukabiliana na usambazaji wa taarifa zisizo na usawa, na kutumia hasara ya msingi ili kuruhusu kupunguzwa kwa pamoja na decodi. Utafiti wa binadamu unaonyesha kuwa muundo wetu unatengeneza miitikio yenye hisia. Zaidi ya hayo, mifano yetu inaonyesha misingi mbalimbali yenye nguvu juu ya hatua za uchunguzi binafsi kama vile vipimo vya F1 na BLEU, na hivyo yanasababisha miitikio ya kutosha.', 'af': "'n Onlangse onderwerp van ondersoek in natuurlike taal generasie is die ontwikkeling van outomatiese reaksie generasie modules wat outomaties kan reageer na 'n gebruiker se uitspraak op 'n empatiese manier. Vorige ondersoek het hierdie taak met gebruik van neurale genereerbare metodes deur emosie klasse te groei met die invoer sekwensies. Maar die uitvoerdes van hierdie modele mag dalk ongelukkig wees. Ons gebruik multi-taak leer om die emosie etiket te voorskou en om 'n beskikbaar antwoord te genereer vir 'n gegewe uitdrukking te gebruik met 'n gemeenskaplike enkoder met veelvuldige dekodere. Ons voorgestelde enkoder-dekoder model bestaan van 'n self-aandag gebaseerde enkoder en' n dekoder met punt produkt aandag mekanisme om reaksie te genereer met 'n gespesifiseerde emosie. Ons gebruik die fokale verlies om onbalanse data verspreiding te hanteer, en gebruik die konsistensies verlies om koerende dekodering te toelaat deur die dekodere. Mense evaluasie vertoon dat ons model meer emosioneel pertinent reaksies produseer. In addition, our model outperforms multiple strong baselines on automatic evaluation measures such as F1 and BLEU scores, thus resulting in more fluent and adequate responses.", 'tr': 'Doýal diller döredilişinde araştyrmalar üçin iň soňky tema, ullançylaryň s özlerine awtomatik bir şekilde jogap berip biljek otomatik jogap döredilmesidir. Öňki araştyrmalar bu zady näural döredijilik yöntemlerini çaklady, duýgym klaslaryny girdi dizileri bilen üýtgeden çözdi. Ýöne bu nusgalaryň netijesi bolmaly däl. Biz duýgularyň etiketini öňlemek üçin köp zady öwrenmek üçin ulanýarys we berilen sözleriň üçin umumy kodeýar bilen täsirli jogaby döretmek üçin ullanýarys. Biziň teklip eden koder-koder modelimiz öz-özüne tabanly koder we nähili produkt üns meýdançasynda bellenen duýgyş bilen jogap etmäge meýilleşdirilýär. Biz fokus kaybını değerlenmiş veri dağıtımı denemek için kullanırız ve şifrelemeli kodlayıcılar tarafından konsantlik kaybını kullanarak kullanırız. Adamyň deňleşmegimiz nusgymyzyň duýgylyk bilen wajyp jogaplary täsir edýändigini görkezýär. Ayrıca, modelimiz F1 we BLEU noktalary ýaly otomatik deňlenme çözümlerinde birnäçe güýçli temel hatlary üstüne çykar, bu sebäpli wajyplyk we ýeterli jogaplary bolup getirdi.', 'hy': 'Բնական լեզվի ստեղծման հետազոտությունների վերջին թեման այն է, որ ավտոմատ արձագանքի ստեղծման մոդուլներ են ստեղծվել, որոնք կարող են ինքնաբերաբար արձագանքել օգտագործողի արտահայտությանը կարեկցանքով: Անցյալ հետազոտությունները լուծել են այս խնդիրը օգտագործելով նյարդային սերունդների մեթոդներ՝ աճելով զգացմունքների դասերը ներմուծման հաջորդականությամբ: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս մոդելների արդյունքները կարող են անհամապատասխան լինել: We employ multi-task learning to predict the emotion label and to generate a viable response for a given utterance using a common encoder with multiple decoders.  Մեր առաջարկված կոդեր-կոդերի մոդելը կազմված է ինքնաուշադրության հիմնված կոդերից և կոդերից, որն ունի կետ արտադրության ուշադրության մեխանիզմ, որպեսզի ստեղծի պատասխան որոշ զգացմունքներով: Մենք օգտագործում ենք ֆոկալ կորուստը անհավասարակշռության տվյալների բաշխման համար, և օգտագործում ենք կորստիկանության կորուստը, որպեսզի դիկոդերները կարողանան համապատասխան կոդավորել: Մարդկային գնահատումը բացահայտում է, որ մեր մոդելը ստեղծում է ավելի էմոցիոնալ պատասխաններ: Ավելին, մեր մոդելը արտադրում է ավտոմատիկ գնահատման չափումների բազմաթիվ ուժեղ հիմքեր, ինչպիսիք են F1-ը և ԲԼԵՎ-ը, ինչը հանգեցնում է ավելի հեշտ և հարմար արձագանքների:', 'az': 'Təbiətli dil nəsilindəki araştırmaların son bir məs əli, istifadəçin in sözlərinə automatsk şəkildə cavab verə biləcək avtomatik reaksiya nəsillərinin təhsil edilməsi idi. Əvvəlki araştırma bu işi nöral generativ metodları vasitəsilə imkan sıralarını artırmaq vasitəsilə çəkdi. Ancaq bu modellərin sonuçları müqayisədə olmayabilir. Biz duygusal etiketini təmin etmək üçün çoxlu iş öyrənməyi və çoxlu kodlayıcı ilə müxtəlif bir sözlə istifadə etmək üçün müvəffəqi bir cavab yaratmaq üçün istifadə edirik. Bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz kodlayıcı modellərimiz, özünüzə təsirli kodlayıcıdır və nöqtə məhsulları gözləmə mehanizmi ilə dəkodlayıcıdır ki, müəyyən edilmiş hisslərlə reaksiya yaratmaq üçün. Biz fokus kaybını müəyyən edilməmiş verilər dağıtılışını idarə etmək üçün istifadə edirik və dekoderlərin müəyyən edilməsi üçün müəyyən edilməsi üçün istifadə edirik. İnsan değerlendirməsi göstərir ki, modellərimiz emosiyal olaraq daha münasibətli cavab verər. Əvvəlcə, modellərimiz F1 və BLEU nöqtələri kimi avtomatik değerlendirmək ölçülərinə çoxlu qüvvətli sətirlərdən üstün gəlir, buna görə də daha ağır və daha uyğun cavab verər.', 'sq': 'Një temë e fundit e kërkimit në gjenerimin natyror të gjuhës ka qenë zhvillimi i moduleve të gjenerimit automatik të përgjigjes që mund të përgjigjen automatikisht në shprehjen e një përdoruesi në një mënyrë empatike. Kërkimet e mëparshme kanë trajtuar këtë detyrë duke përdorur metoda gjenerative neuronale duke rritur klasat emocionale me sekuencat e hyrjes. Megjithatë, rezultatet nga këto modele mund të jenë jo konsistente. Ne përdorim mësimin me shumë detyra për të parashikuar etiketën e emocioneve dhe për të gjeneruar një përgjigje të jetueshme për një shprehje të caktuar duke përdorur një kodues të përbashkët me shumë dekoderë. Modeli ynë i propozuar i kodifikuesit-dekoderit përbëhet nga një kodifikues i bazuar në vetëvëmendje dhe një dekoder me mekanizmin e vëmendjes së pikave të prodhimit për të gjeneruar përgjigje me një emocion të caktuar. Ne përdorim humbjen fokale për të trajtuar shpërndarjen e të dhënave të paekuilibruara, dhe përdorim humbjen e konsistencës për të lejuar dekodimin koherent nga dekoderët. Vlerësimi njerëzor zbulon se modeli ynë prodhon përgjigje më të rëndësishme emocionale. In addition, our model outperforms multiple strong baselines on automatic evaluation measures such as F1 and BLEU scores, thus resulting in more fluent and adequate responses.', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রজন্মে গবেষণার একটি বিষয় হচ্ছে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রজন্ম মডিউলের উন্নয়ন যা ব্যবহারকারীর বক্তব্য স্ব পূর্ববর্তী গবেষণা ইনপুটের সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত অনুভূতির মাধ্যমে নিউরেল জেনারেটিভ পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করে এই কাজের সা তবে এই মডেলের আউটপুট সম্ভবত অসম্পূর্ণ হতে পারে। আমরা অনুভূতির লেবেল ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করার জন্য মাল্টিক কাজ শিক্ষা করি এবং বেশ কয়েকটি কোডার ব্যবহার করে একটি সাধারণ কোডার ব্যবহার করে একটি বিশ্ আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত এনকোডার-ডেকোডার মডেলের মধ্যে একটি আত্মমনোযোগ বিভিন্ন কোডার এবং একটি ডেকোডার, যার মধ্যে একটি নির্দিষ্ট অনুভূতির আমরা ফোকেল ক্ষতি ব্যবহার করি অসম্পূর্ণ তথ্য বিতরণের মাধ্যমে ব্যবহার করি এবং সংশ্লিষ্ট ক্ষতি ব্যবহার করি ডেকোডারের মাধ্যমে কোন ক মানুষের মূল্য প্রকাশ করে যে আমাদের মডেল আরো আবেগের প্রতিক্রিয়া তৈরি করে। এছাড়াও, আমাদের মডেল স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মূল্যের ব্যাপারে বেশ কয়েকটি শক্তিশালী বেসেলাইন প্রকাশ করে, যেমন এফ১ এবং বিলিউ স্কোরের মত, তাই ত', 'bs': 'Nedavna tema istraživanja u generaciji prirodnog jezika bila je razvoj modula generacije automatskih odgovora koji mogu automatski odgovoriti na govor korisnika na empatičan način. Prethodno istraživanje je riješilo ovaj zadatak koristeći neuralne generativne metode povećanjem časova emocija sa ulaznim sekvencijama. Međutim, rezultati ovih modela mogu biti nepristojni. Mi zapošljavamo učenje više zadataka kako bi predvidjeli etiketu emocija i stvorili održivi odgovor na određenu govor koristeći zajednički koder sa višestrukim dekoderima. Naš predloženi model kodera-dekodera se sastoji od kodera na samopouzdanju i dekodera sa mehanizam pažnje to čkog proizvoda kako bi stvorio odgovor sa određenim emocijama. Koristimo gubitak fokusa kako bi se bavili distribucijom nelabalansiranih podataka i iskoristili gubitak konsekvencije kako bi omogućili saslušan dekodiranje dekodiranja. Ljudska procjena pokazuje da naš model proizvodi emocionalnije odgovore. Osim toga, naš model iznosi višestruke jake osnovne linije na mjerama automatske procjene kao što su F1 i BLEU rezultati, što rezultira tečnijim i odgovarajućim odgovorima.', 'ca': "Un tema recent de recerca en la generació de llengües natural s ha estat el desenvolupament de móduls de generació de resposta automàtica que poden respondre automàticament a la expressió d'un usuari d'una manera empàtica. La recerca anterior ha abordat aquesta tasca utilitzant mètodes neurogeneradors augmentant les classes emocionals amb les seqüències d'entrada. Però els resultats d'aquests models poden ser inconsistents. Empreguem aprenentatge multitascat per predir l'etiqueta emocional i generar una resposta viable per una expressió dada utilitzant un codificador comú amb múltiples decoders. El nostre model proposat de codificador-decodificador consisteix en un codificador basat en l'autoatenció i un codificador amb un mecanisme d'atenció del producte puntual per generar resposta amb una emoció especificada. Utilitzem la pèrdua focal per gestionar la distribució desequilibrada de dades, i utilitzem la pèrdua de consistencia per permetre la decodificació coherent pels decoders. L'evaluació humana revela que el nostre model produeix respostes més emocionalment pertinents. In addition, our model outperforms multiple strong baselines on automatic evaluation measures such as F1 and BLEU scores, thus resulting in more fluent and adequate responses.", 'am': 'በተፈጠረ ቋንቋ ትውልድ ውስጥ ምርመራ የተደረገ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ትውልድ አካባቢ ትውልድ አካባቢ አካል፣ በተጠቃሚ ቋንቋ ቋንቋን በተቃራኒ ቋንቋ እንዲመልስ ይችላል፡፡ የቀድሞው ትምህርት ይህ ስራ በጥያቄው ውስጥ በጥያቄ ክፍሎች ሲጨምር የናውሬል አዳራዊ ሥርዓት በመጠቀም ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን እነዚህ ዓይነቶች የውጤቶች ውጤቶች አይተካከሉም፡፡ የስብሰባውን ምልክት ለመግለጥ በብዙ ስራ ትምህርት እና በብዙ ቀድሚያዎች ጋር በተለየ የድምፅ ቃላት ለመፍጠር እናስገድዳለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው የሆኑት የኮድዶር አካባቢ ሞዴል በራሱ ላይ የተመሳሳይ የኮድዶር ክፍል እና በተወሰነ እውቀት ላይ መልስ ማድረግ የዶዶክድ አካል ነው፡፡ የፎክሎ ጉዳይ የዳታ መክፈቻን ለመቀበል እናጠቅማለን እና የክፍለ ክፍተቶችን በመቀበል እናስቀጣለን፡፡ የሰው ውጤት ሞዴላያችን በአሳማሚ መልስ የሚያሳውቅ ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ሞዴላያችን እንደ F1 እና BLEU scores በሚመስል በራሱ ማስታወቂያ ላይ በብዙ ኃይለኛ መደገፊያዎችን ያሳድጋል፡፡', 'cs': 'Nedávným tématem výzkumu v oblasti generování přirozeného jazyka je vývoj modulů automatické generace odpovědí, které dokáží automaticky reagovat na výrok uživatele empatickým způsobem. Předchozí výzkum tento úkol řešil pomocí neuronových generačních metod rozšířením emočních tříd o vstupní sekvence. Výstupy těchto modelů však mohou být nekonzistentní. Využíváme multi-tasking learning k předpovědi etikety emocí a generování životaschopné odezvy na daný výrok pomocí společného kodéru s více dekodéry. Náš navržený kodér-dekodér model se skládá z snímače založeného na vlastní pozornosti a dekodéru s mechanismem pozornosti dot product pro generování odezvy se specifikovanými emocemi. Používáme fokální ztrátu k řešení nerovnovážené distribuce dat a využíváme ztrátu konzistence, abychom umožnili koherentní dekódování dekodéry. Lidské hodnocení ukazuje, že náš model produkuje emocionálně relevantnější reakce. Navíc náš model překonává několik silných základních linií na automatických hodnotících měřeních, jako jsou F1 a BLEU skóre, což vede k plynulějším a adekvátnějším reakcím.', 'et': 'Hiljutine looduskeele generatsiooni uurimisteema on olnud automaatse reageerimise moodulite väljatöötamine, mis suudavad automaatselt reageerida kasutaja väljendusele empaatiliselt. Varasemad uuringud on seda ülesannet käsitlenud neurogeneratiivsete meetodite abil, suurendades emotsiooniklasse sisendjärjestustega. Nende mudelite väljundid võivad siiski olla vastuolulised. Me kasutame mitme ülesandega õppimist emotsioonide märgistuse prognoosimiseks ja konkreetsele väljendile elujõulise reaktsiooni loomiseks, kasutades ühist kodeerijat, millel on mitu dekoodrit. Meie pakutud kodeerija-dekooder mudel koosneb enesetähelepanu põhinevast kodeerijast ja punkti toote tähelepanu mehhanismiga dekoodrist, et tekitada reaktsioon kindlaksmääratud emotsiooniga. Me kasutame fookuskadu, et käsitleda tasakaalustamatut andmejaotust ja kasutame järjepidevuse kadu, et võimaldada dekoodritel sidusat dekodeerimist. Inimeste hindamine näitab, et meie mudel annab emotsionaalselt asjakohasemaid vastuseid. Lisaks ületab meie mudel automaatsete hindamismeetmete, näiteks F1 ja BLEU skoorid, mitmeid tugevaid lähtejooni, mis annab tulemuseks sujuvamad ja adekvaatsemad vastused.', 'fi': 'Luonnonkielen tuottamisen viimeaikainen tutkimusaihe on ollut automaattisten vastausten generointimoduulien kehittäminen, jotka pystyvät automaattisesti vastaamaan käyttäjän ilmaisuun empaattisesti. Aiemmat tutkimukset ovat käsitelleet tätä tehtävää neurogeneratiivisilla menetelmillä lisäämällä tunneluokkia syöttösekvensseillä. Näiden mallien tuotokset voivat kuitenkin olla epäjohdonmukaisia. Käytämme monitehtäväoppimista tunnetunnuksen ennustamiseen ja käyttökelpoisen vastauksen tuottamiseen tietylle lauseelle käyttämällä yhteistä kooderia, jossa on useita dekoodereita. Ehdotettu kooderi-dekooderimalli koostuu itsetarkkaavaisuuteen perustuvasta kooderista ja dekooderista, jossa on piste-tuotteen huomiomekanismi, joka tuottaa vasteen tietyllä tunteella. Käytämme fokusaalista häviötä käsittelemään epätasapainoista tiedonjakoa ja käytämme johdonmukaisuuden häviötä mahdollistaaksemme dekooderien johdonmukaisen dekoodauksen. Ihmisten arviointi osoittaa, että mallimme tuottaa enemmän emotionaalisesti merkityksellisiä vastauksia. Lisäksi mallimme suoriutuu useista vahvoista lähtökohdista automaattisissa arviointitoimenpiteissä, kuten F1- ja BLEU-pisteissä, mikä johtaa sujuvampaan ja riittävämpään vasteeseen.', 'sk': 'Nedavna tema raziskav na področju generiranja naravnega jezika je bila razvoj modulov avtomatskega generiranja odzivov, ki se lahko samodejno odzovejo na uporabnikovo izjavo na empatičen način. Prejšnje raziskave so to nalogo obravnavale z uporabo nevronskih generativnih metod z dopolnjevanjem čustvenih razredov z vhodnimi sekvencami. Vendar pa so rezultati teh modelov lahko neskladni. Uporabljamo večopravilno učenje za napovedovanje oznake čustev in ustvarjanje izvedljivega odziva za določen izgovor s skupnim kodirnikom z več dekoderji. Naš predlagani model kodirnika-dekodirnika je sestavljen iz samopozornosti temelječega kodirnika in dekodirnika z mehanizmom pozornosti izdelka za ustvarjanje odziva z določenim čustvom. Focalno izgubo uporabljamo za obvladovanje neravnotežene porazdelitve podatkov in izgubo konsistentnosti uporabljamo, da omogočimo koherentno dekodiranje s pomočjo sprejemnikov. Človeška ocena kaže, da naš model ustvarja bolj čustveno ustrezne odzive. Poleg tega naš model presega več močnih izhodišč pri samodejnih merilih ocenjevanja, kot sta rezultati F1 in BLEU, kar ima za posledico tekočejši in ustreznejši odziv.', 'ha': "Wata jiyyar research na ƙarshen harshen na natura ta kasance an developer module na zaɓen ajir da farat ɗaya, wanda zai iya iya karɓa maganar mai amfani da shi farat ɗaya cikin wani hanyor empatic. Tayyar da zaman tafiti ya motsa wannan aikin da ya yi amfani da shiryoyin neural na'ura da kuma ya ƙara darafõfi na hisani da mazaɓa. A lokacin da ake samun waɗannan misãlai ko kuma ba su sami ba. We employ multi-task learning to predict the emotion label and to generate a viable response for a given utterance using a common encoder with multiple decoders.  Misãlin kode-koda da aka buɗe shi yana daga kode mai amfani da kansa, kuma yana da kode mai amfani da alama masu nau'in da za'a danne ajiya da wani hisani na ƙayyade. Munã amfani da hasara na focal don mu yi amfani da rabon data ba da taƙaita ba, kuma tuna amfani da hasara na daidaita don ya yarda kodi kodi da kodi. Ana ƙaddara mutum yana bayyana cewa misalinmu yana samar da masĩfun masu kamid da kashfa. Da wannan, misalinmu yana samar masu ƙari masu ƙarfi a kan muhalli farat ɗaya kamar score F1 da BLEU, don haka yana ƙara masu buƙata da masu isa.", 'jv': 'Tema sing resmi barêng ngêdol kanggo kelelah ning limi dadi, dumadhi kapan sistem sing nguasai perusahaan karo modul sing ora bisa otomatik menehi akeh ngubah winih ning acara kelangan usual. Awak dhéwé sing isih perbudhakan nggawe task iki digawe, gambar kelas kuwi nggawe luwih-luwih cara sing dirampakan karo sekonduran input. Nanging, bisa diputasak model iki dadi bisa ora bisa nggawe. Awak dhéwé nggunakake plur-task kang ngerasakno nggawe etiket duwan ngono ngéwangi respons sing beraksi kanggo nguasakno koder ptaaken karo akeh operasi Ndheke nambah koder-decoder model sing dumadhi karo pergambar aturan sampeyan nguasai koder karo pergambar barang dot dot dot Speaking Ndelengé wong liyane mungkun ajeng-ajeng dumadhi kita angkang sampeyan luwih dumadhi Nambah, modelo nambah sing wis ngerasakno akeh basa sing luwih dadi, ngono langgambar sistem sing otomatik sing koyo F1 karo kalih sing nggawe blok, dadi sing bisa dianggap luwih-luwih lan ngelarang liyane', 'he': 'נושא חדש של מחקר בדור שפת טבעית היה הפיתוח של מודולים של דור התגובה אוטומטית שיכולים להגיב באופן אוטומטי לטובתו של משתמש באופן אמפטי. מחקר קודם התמודד עם המשימה הזאת באמצעות שיטות דור עצביים על ידי גידול שיעורי רגשות עם רצפי הכניסה. However, the outputs by these models may be inconsistent.  אנו משתמשים ללמוד במשימות רבות כדי לחזות את תווית הרגשות וליצור תגובה חיונית למילה מסוימת באמצעות קודד משותף עם קודנים רבים. מודל הקודר-פיקוד המוצע שלנו מורכב ממקוד שמבוסס על תשומת לב עצמית ומקוד עם מנגנון תשומת לב של תוצר נקודות כדי ליצור תגובה עם רגש מסוים. אנו משתמשים באובדן המרכזי כדי להתמודד עם פיצול נתונים לא מאוזן, ולהשתמש באובדן התקבילות כדי לאפשר לפענח תואם על ידי הפענחים. הערכה האנושית מראה שהמודל שלנו יוצר תגובות יותר רלוונטיות רגשית. בנוסף, הדוגמא שלנו מובילה יותר ממספר קווי בסיס חזקים על אמצעי הערכה אוטומטיים כמו נקודות F1 ו BLEU, מה שמוביל בכך לתגובות נוזלות ומתאימות יותר.', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་ནང་གི་བརྗོད་དུ་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཅིག་ནི་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ལན་གསལ་ལེན་བྱ་ཚིག་ལས་གསར་བསྐྲུན་ཡོད སྔོན་གྱི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་བྱས་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་འདི་བེད་སྤྱོད་བྱས་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། མིག་དཔེ་འདིའི་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་དེ་ཚོར་མི་མཐུན་པ་ཡིན་སྲིད། ང་ཚོས་སྐོར་གྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་ཆ་རྩིས་སྤྱད་ནས་སེམས་ཚོར་ཡུལ་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་སྔོན་སྟོན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་encoder-decoder་རྣམ་གྲངས་ནང་དུ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་གཞི་བཞག་པའི་ཨིན་ཀོ་ཌིས་དང་ཨིན་ཀོ་ཌིས་འདྲ་བྱེད་སྐབས་dot product attention mechanism We use the focal loss to handle imbalanced data distribution, and utilize the consistency loss to allow coherent decoding by the decoders. ནི་མིའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་སེམས་ཚོར་མཐུན་པ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཐུབ་པ་རེད། In addition, our model outperforms multiple strong baselines on automatic evaluation measures such as F1 and BLEU scores, resulting in more fluent and adequate responses.'}
{'en': 'Modeling Context in Answer Sentence Selection Systems on a Latency Budget', 'es': 'Modelado del contexto en los sistemas de selección de oraciones de respuesta con un presupuesto', 'fr': 'Modélisation du contexte dans les systèmes de sélection de phrases de réponse sur un budget', 'pt': 'Contexto de modelagem em sistemas de seleção de frases de resposta em um orçamento de latência', 'ar': 'نمذجة السياق في أنظمة تحديد جمل الإجابة على ميزانية زمن الوصول', 'ja': 'レイテンシー予算の回答文選択システムのコンテキストのモデリング', 'zh': '基于延迟预算的答案句子选择系统中的上下文建模', 'hi': 'एक विलंबता बजट पर उत्तर वाक्य चयन सिस्टम में मॉडलिंग प्रसंग', 'ru': 'Моделирование контекста в системах выбора предложений ответов на бюджет латентности', 'ga': 'Comhthéacs a Shamhaltú i gCórais Roghnúcháin Pianbhreitheanna Freagraí ar Bhuiséad Cuain', 'hu': 'Kontextus modellezése a válaszmondat kiválasztási rendszerekben késedelmes költségvetésen', 'it': 'Modellazione del contesto nei sistemi di selezione delle frasi di risposta su un budget di latenza', 'kk': 'Жауап сөзді таңдау жүйелерінде контексті үлгілеу', 'lt': 'Modeling Context in Answer Sentence Selection Systems on a Latency Budget', 'ka': 'მოდელური კონტექსტი პასუხის მონიშნული სისტემაში შემდეგ ბიჯეტის შემდეგ', 'ml': 'ലാറ്റെന്\u200dസി ബാഗ്ടെറ്റില്\u200d ഉത്തരം തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന വിധികളില്\u200d മോഡലിങ് ഉള്ളടക്കം', 'mk': 'Моделирање на контекст во системите за избор на одговорни реченици на буџетот за задоцнување', 'mn': 'Хариулт өгүүлбэр сонголтын системийн загварын контекст', 'no': 'Modeleringskontekst i utval av svarsetsetningssystemer på ein latency- budget', 'mt': 'L-immudellar tal-Kuntest fis-Sistemi tal-Għa żla tas-Sentenzi fuq Baġit ta’ Latenza', 'pl': 'Modelowanie kontekstu w systemach wyboru zdań odpowiedzi na budżet opóźniony', 'sr': 'Modeliranje konteksta u sustavima odabranja odgovora kazne na budžetu kasnije', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරතිචාර වාර්තාව තෝරාගන්න පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර පද්ධතිය', 'so': 'Qoraalka ku qoran jawaabta Doorashada Doorashada Systems on a Latency Budget', 'el': 'Μοντελοποίηση πλαισίου σε συστήματα επιλογής προτάσεων απάντησης σε προϋπολογισμό αργοπορίας', 'sv': 'Modellera kontext i system för val av svarsfrågor på en förseningsbudget', 'ta': 'வாக்கியம் தேர்ந்தெடுப்பு அமைப்புகளில் மாதிரியான உள்ளடக்கம்', 'ms': 'Modeling Context in Answer Sentence Selection Systems on a Latency Budget', 'ro': 'Modelarea contextului în sistemele de selectare a sentințelor de răspuns pe un buget de latență', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chế độ ngữ cảnh trong hệ thống chọn câu trả lời về một ngân sách.', 'bg': 'Моделиране на контекст в системите за избор на изречения за отговор при бюджет за закъснение', 'de': 'Modellierung von Kontext in Answer Satz Selection Systemen auf einem Latenzbudget', 'nl': 'Modeling Context in Antwoordenselectiesystemen op basis van een Latency Budget', 'da': 'Modellering af kontekst i systemer til valg af svarsætninger på et forsinkelsesbudget', 'hr': 'Modeliranje konteksta u sustavima izbora odgovora kazne na proračun kasnije', 'id': 'Modeling Context in Answer Sentence Selection Systems on a Latency Budget', 'fa': 'موضوع مدل\u200cبندی در سیستم\u200cهای انتخاب پاسخ\u200cبندی در یک Budget Latency', 'ko': '지연 예산 기반 응답문 선택 시스템 상하문 모델링', 'sw': 'Mifumo ya Uchaguzi wa Hukumu kwenye bajeti ya Kusini', 'tr': 'Soňra sözleri saýlaw sistemlerinde nusgala', 'af': "Modelering Konteks in Antwoord Sentence Keuse Stelse op 'n Latency Budget", 'sq': 'Modelimi i kontekstit në sistemet e zgjedhjes së dënimeve në një buxhet vonesë', 'am': 'ምርጫ', 'az': 'Qeyd S칬z칲 Se칞im Sisteml톛rind톛 T톛rc칲m톛 Konteksti', 'bn': 'শাস্তি নির্বাচন সিস্টেমে মডেলিং বিষয়বস্তু ল্যাটেন্সি বাজেটের উপর', 'bs': 'Modeliranje konteksta u sustavima odabranja odgovora kazne na budžetu Latency', 'cs': 'Modelování kontextu v systémech výběru vět odpovědi na latencní rozpočet', 'et': 'Vastulause valimise süsteemide modelleerimise kontekst viivituseelarve alusel', 'ca': 'Modelar el context en els sistemes de selecció de sentences en un pressupost de retard', 'fi': 'Mallinnuskonteksti vastauslauseiden valintajärjestelmissä latenssibudjetilla', 'hy': 'Պատասխանի արտահայտության ընտրության համակարգերի կոնտեքստի մոդելավորում', 'jv': "Menu item to Open 'Search for Open Files' dialog", 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'מודל הקשר במערכות בחירת גזר תשובה על תקציב מאוחר', 'sk': 'Modeliranje konteksta v sistemih za izbiro odgovorov na proračun za zamudo', 'bo': 'རྗེས་མའི་ཆ་དེབ་ཐོག་ཏུ་མཐུན་པ་ནང་མ་དབྱིབས་སྒྱུར་བའི་རྣམ་གྲངས'}
{'en': 'Answer Sentence Selection (AS2) is an efficient approach for the design of open-domain Question Answering (QA) systems. In order to achieve low latency, traditional AS2 models score question-answer pairs individually, ignoring any information from the document each potential answer was extracted from. In contrast, more computationally expensive models designed for machine reading comprehension tasks typically receive one or more passages as input, which often results in better accuracy. In this work, we present an approach to efficiently incorporate contextual information in AS2 models. For each answer candidate, we first use unsupervised similarity techniques to extract relevant sentences from its source document, which we then feed into an efficient transformer architecture fine-tuned for AS2. Our best approach, which leverages a multi-way attention architecture to efficiently encode context, improves 6 % to 11 % over non-contextual state of the art in AS2 with minimal impact on system latency. All experiments in this work were conducted in English.', 'pt': 'A seleção de sentenças de resposta (AS2) é uma abordagem eficiente para o projeto de sistemas de resposta a perguntas (QA) de domínio aberto. Para obter baixa latência, os modelos AS2 tradicionais pontuam os pares de perguntas e respostas individualmente, ignorando qualquer informação do documento do qual cada resposta potencial foi extraída. Em contraste, modelos mais caros computacionalmente projetados para tarefas de compreensão de leitura de máquina normalmente recebem uma ou mais passagens como entrada, o que geralmente resulta em melhor precisão. Neste trabalho, apresentamos uma abordagem para incorporar eficientemente informações contextuais em modelos AS2. Para cada candidato a resposta, primeiro usamos técnicas de similaridade não supervisionadas para extrair sentenças relevantes de seu documento de origem, que então alimentamos em uma arquitetura de transformador eficiente ajustada para AS2. Nossa melhor abordagem, que aproveita uma arquitetura de atenção multidirecional para codificar o contexto com eficiência, melhora de 6% a 11% em relação ao estado da arte não contextual em AS2 com impacto mínimo na latência do sistema. Todos os experimentos neste trabalho foram conduzidos em inglês.', 'ar': 'اختيار جملة الإجابة (AS2) هو أسلوب فعال لتصميم أنظمة الإجابة على الأسئلة (QA) ذات المجال المفتوح. من أجل تحقيق زمن انتقال منخفض ، تقوم نماذج AS2 التقليدية بتسجيل أزواج الأسئلة والإجابات بشكل فردي ، متجاهلة أي معلومات من المستند تم استخلاص كل إجابة محتملة منها. في المقابل ، عادةً ما تتلقى النماذج الأكثر تكلفة من الناحية الحسابية المصممة لمهام فهم القراءة الآلية مقطعًا واحدًا أو أكثر كمدخلات ، مما يؤدي غالبًا إلى دقة أفضل. في هذا العمل ، نقدم نهجًا لدمج المعلومات السياقية بكفاءة في نماذج AS2. لكل مرشح إجابة ، نستخدم أولاً تقنيات التشابه غير الخاضعة للإشراف لاستخراج الجمل ذات الصلة من مستند المصدر الخاص به ، والذي نقوم بعد ذلك بإدخاله في بنية محولات فعالة تم ضبطها بدقة لـ AS2. أفضل نهج لدينا ، والذي يستفيد من بنية الانتباه متعدد الاتجاهات لتشفير السياق بكفاءة ، يحسن من 6٪ إلى 11٪ على حالة الفن غير السياقية في AS2 مع تأثير ضئيل على زمن انتقال النظام. أجريت جميع التجارب في هذا العمل باللغة الإنجليزية.', 'es': 'La selección de oraciones de respuesta (AS2) es un enfoque eficaz para el diseño de sistemas de respuesta a preguntas (QA) de dominio abierto. Para lograr una latencia baja, los modelos AS2 tradicionales puntúan los pares de preguntas y respuestas de forma individual, ignorando cualquier información del documento del que se extrajo cada respuesta potencial. Por el contrario, los modelos más costosos desde el punto de vista computacional diseñados para tareas de comprensión de lectura automática suelen recibir uno o más pasajes como entrada, lo que a menudo resulta en una mayor precisión. En este trabajo, presentamos un enfoque para incorporar de manera eficiente la información contextual en los modelos AS2. Para cada candidato de respuesta, primero utilizamos técnicas de similitud no supervisadas para extraer frases relevantes de su documento fuente, que luego incorporamos a una arquitectura de transformador eficiente ajustada para AS2. Nuestro mejor enfoque, que aprovecha una arquitectura de atención multidireccional para codificar el contexto de manera eficiente, mejora entre un 6 y un 11% con respecto al estado de la técnica no contextual en AS2 con un impacto mínimo en la latencia del sistema. Todos los experimentos de este trabajo se realizaron en inglés.', 'fr': "La sélection de phrases de réponse (AS2) est une approche efficace pour la conception de systèmes de réponse aux questions (QA) de domaine ouvert. Afin d'obtenir une faible latence, les modèles AS2 traditionnels évaluent les paires question-réponse individuellement, en ignorant toutes les informations du document dont chaque réponse potentielle a été extraite. En revanche, les modèles plus coûteux en calcul conçus pour les tâches de compréhension de lecture automatique reçoivent généralement un ou plusieurs passages en entrée, ce qui se traduit souvent par une meilleure précision. Dans ce travail, nous présentons une approche permettant d'intégrer efficacement les informations contextuelles dans les modèles AS2. Pour chaque candidat à la réponse, nous utilisons d'abord des techniques de similarité non supervisées pour extraire les phrases pertinentes de son document source, que nous introduisons ensuite dans une architecture de transformateur efficace affinée pour AS2. Notre meilleure approche, qui tire parti d'une architecture d'attention multidirectionnelle pour encoder efficacement le contexte, améliore de 6\xa0% à 11\xa0% par rapport à l'état de la technique non contextuel dans AS2 avec un impact minimal sur la latence du système. Toutes les expériences de ce travail ont été menées en anglais.", 'ja': '回答文選択（ AS 2 ）は、オープンドメイン質問回答（ QA ）システムの設計のための効率的なアプローチです。 低遅延を達成するために、従来のAS 2モデルは、各潜在的な回答が抽出された文書からの情報を無視して、個別に質問回答ペアをスコアリングします。 対照的に、機械読解タスクのために設計されたより計算コストの高いモデルは、典型的には、１つ以上の通路を入力として受け取り、これは多くの場合、より良い精度をもたらす。 本研究では， AS 2モデルにコンテキスト情報を効率的に取り入れるアプローチを提示する． 各回答候補者について、まず監督されていない類似性テクニックを使用して、そのソースドキュメントから関連する文章を抽出し、それをAS 2用に微調整された効率的な変圧器アーキテクチャにフィードバックします。 コンテキストを効率的にエンコードするためにマルチウェイアテンションアーキテクチャを活用する当社の最良のアプローチは、AS 2の非コンテキストの最先端を6%から11%改善し、システムの待ち時間への影響を最小限に抑えます。 本作の実験はすべて英語で行われた。', 'zh': '对案句择 (AS2) 设计开域问答 (QA) 系统有效。 为卑延迟,旧AS2独评分,略取其文档。 为机器读解计算成本益高者受一数段落以为输,此常致善准确性。 于是AS2有效整合上下文信息之法。 凡对案候选者,先用无监督相似性术取其源文档,然后输之AS2微高效转换器架构中。 吾法以多架构为效编码上下文,与AS2中非上下文相比,其为6%至11%,而对系统迟最小。 其事所有实验皆用英语。', 'hi': 'उत्तर वाक्य चयन (AS2) ओपन-डोमेन प्रश्न उत्तर (QA) प्रणालियों के डिजाइन के लिए एक कुशल दृष्टिकोण है। कम विलंबता प्राप्त करने के लिए, पारंपरिक एएस 2 मॉडल व्यक्तिगत रूप से प्रश्न-उत्तर जोड़े स्कोर करते हैं, दस्तावेज़ से किसी भी जानकारी को अनदेखा करते हुए प्रत्येक संभावित उत्तर निकाला गया था। इसके विपरीत, मशीन रीडिंग कॉम्प्रिहेंशन कार्यों के लिए डिज़ाइन किए गए अधिक कम्प्यूटेशनल रूप से महंगे मॉडल आमतौर पर इनपुट के रूप में एक या अधिक मार्ग प्राप्त करते हैं, जिसके परिणामस्वरूप अक्सर बेहतर सटीकता होती है। इस काम में, हम एएस 2 मॉडल में प्रासंगिक जानकारी को कुशलतापूर्वक शामिल करने के लिए एक दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं। प्रत्येक उत्तर उम्मीदवार के लिए, हम पहले अपने स्रोत दस्तावेज़ से प्रासंगिक वाक्यों को निकालने के लिए असुरक्षित समानता तकनीकों का उपयोग करते हैं, जिसे हम तब एएस 2 के लिए एक कुशल ट्रांसफॉर्मर आर्किटेक्चर में ठीक-ठाक करते हैं। हमारा सबसे अच्छा दृष्टिकोण, जो संदर्भ को कुशलतापूर्वक एन्कोड करने के लिए एक बहु-तरफ़ा ध्यान वास्तुकला का लाभ उठाता है, सिस्टम विलंबता पर न्यूनतम प्रभाव के साथ एएस 2 में कला की गैर-प्रासंगिक स्थिति पर 6% से 11% तक सुधार करता है। इस काम में सभी प्रयोग अंग्रेजी में किए गए थे।', 'ru': 'Answer Sentence Selection (AS2) - эффективный подход к проектированию систем ответов на вопросы (QA) с открытым доменом. Для достижения низкой задержки традиционные модели AS2 оценивают пары вопрос-ответ индивидуально, игнорируя любую информацию из документа, из которого был извлечен каждый потенциальный ответ. Напротив, более дорогостоящие с точки зрения вычислений модели, предназначенные для задач понимания машинного чтения, обычно получают один или более отрывков в качестве входных данных, что часто приводит к большей точности. В этой работе мы представляем подход к эффективному включению контекстуальной информации в модели AS2. Для каждого варианта ответа мы сначала используем методы неконтролируемого сходства, чтобы извлечь соответствующие предложения из его исходного документа, который затем мы подаем в эффективную архитектуру трансформатора, доработанную для AS2. Наш лучший подход, который использует многофакторную архитектуру внимания для эффективного кодирования контекста, улучшает от 6% до 11% по сравнению с неконтекстным уровнем техники в AS2 с минимальным влиянием на системную задержку. Все эксперименты в этой работе проводились на английском языке.', 'ga': 'Is cur chuige éifeachtach é Roghnú Pianbhreitheanna Freagraí (AS2) chun córais Fhreagróirí Ceisteanna (QA) fearainn oscailte a dhearadh. Chun foighne íseal a bhaint amach, scórálann samhlacha traidisiúnta AS2 péirí ceisteanna-freagra ina n-aonar, gan aird ar aon eolas ón doiciméad as a baineadh gach freagra féideartha. I gcodarsnacht leis sin, is iondúil go bhfaigheann samhlacha atá níos costasaí ó thaobh ríomhaireachtúil de atá deartha le haghaidh tascanna ríomhthuisceana, sliocht amháin nó níos mó mar ionchur, rud a mbíonn cruinneas níos fearr mar thoradh air go minic. San obair seo, cuirimid cur chuige i láthair chun faisnéis chomhthéacsúil a ionchorprú go héifeachtach i múnlaí AS2. Maidir le gach iarrthóir freagra, bainimid úsáid as teicníochtaí cosúlachta gan mhaoirseacht ar dtús chun abairtí ábhartha a bhaint as a dhoiciméad foinseach, agus ansin cuirimid le hailtireacht éifeachtach claochladán atá mionchoigeartaithe do AS2. Feabhsaítear an cur chuige is fearr atá againn, a ghiaráil ailtireacht aird ilbhealaigh chun comhthéacs a ionchódú go héifeachtach, 6% go 11% thar an úrscothacht neamh-chomhthéacsúil in AS2 le tionchar íosta ar fholaíocha an chórais. Rinneadh gach turgnamh san obair seo i mBéarla.', 'el': 'Η επιλογή προτάσεων απάντησης (AS2) είναι μια αποτελεσματική προσέγγιση για τον σχεδιασμό συστημάτων απαντήσεων σε ερωτήσεις ανοικτού τομέα (QA). Προκειμένου να επιτευχθεί χαμηλή καθυστέρηση, τα παραδοσιακά μοντέλα βαθμολογούν ζεύγη ερωτήσεων-απαντήσεων ξεχωριστά, αγνοώντας τυχόν πληροφορίες από το έγγραφο από το οποίο εξάγεται κάθε πιθανή απάντηση. Αντίθετα, πιο ακριβά υπολογιστικά μοντέλα σχεδιασμένα για εργασίες κατανόησης μηχανικής ανάγνωσης συνήθως λαμβάνουν ένα ή περισσότερα περάσματα ως εισαγωγή, γεγονός που συχνά οδηγεί σε καλύτερη ακρίβεια. Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια προσέγγιση για την αποτελεσματική ενσωμάτωση πληροφοριών περιβάλλοντος σε μοντέλα AS2. Για κάθε υποψήφιο απάντησης, χρησιμοποιούμε πρώτα τεχνικές ομοιότητας χωρίς επίβλεψη για να εξάγουμε σχετικές προτάσεις από το έγγραφο προέλευσης του, τις οποίες στη συνέχεια τροφοδοτούμε σε μια αποδοτική αρχιτεκτονική μετασχηματιστή συντονισμένη για το AS2. Η καλύτερη προσέγγισή μας, η οποία αξιοποιεί μια αρχιτεκτονική προσοχής πολλαπλών κατευθύνσεων για την αποτελεσματική κωδικοποίηση του περιβάλλοντος, βελτιώνει 6% έως 11% σε σχέση με την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας που δεν έχει σχέση με το περιβάλλον, με ελάχιστο αντίκτυπο στην καθυστέρηση του συστήματος. Όλα τα πειράματα σε αυτή την εργασία διεξήχθησαν στα αγγλικά.', 'hu': 'A Válasz mondat kiválasztása (AS2) hatékony megközelítés nyílt domain kérdésre válaszoló rendszerek tervezéséhez. Az alacsony késleltetés érdekében a hagyományos AS2 modellek külön-külön értékelik a kérdés-válasz párokat, figyelmen kívül hagyva a dokumentumból származó információkat. Ezzel szemben a gépi olvasási feladatokra tervezett, számítástechnikailag drágább modellek általában egy vagy több részt kapnak bemenetként, ami gyakran jobb pontosságot eredményez. Ebben a munkában bemutatjuk a kontextuális információk hatékony beépítését az AS2 modellekbe. Minden válaszjelölt esetében először felügyelet nélküli hasonlósági technikákat alkalmazunk a releváns mondatok kivonására a forrásdokumentumból, amelyeket aztán egy hatékony, AS2-hez finomhangolt transzformátor architektúrába vezetünk be. A legjobb megközelítésünk, amely a többirányú figyelem architektúrát használja a kontextus hatékony kódolására, 6-11%-kal javul a nem kontextuális technológia állapotához képest az AS2-ben, minimális hatással a rendszer késleltetésére. Ebben a munkában minden kísérletet angol nyelven végeztek.', 'it': "Answer Sentence Selection (AS2) è un approccio efficiente per la progettazione di sistemi open-domain Question Answering (QA). Al fine di ottenere una bassa latenza, i modelli AS2 tradizionali segnano coppie domanda-risposta individualmente, ignorando qualsiasi informazione dal documento da cui ogni potenziale risposta è stata estratta. Al contrario, i modelli più costosi dal punto di vista computazionale progettati per le attività di comprensione della lettura automatica ricevono in genere uno o più passaggi come input, il che spesso si traduce in una maggiore precisione. In questo lavoro, presentiamo un approccio per incorporare in modo efficiente le informazioni contestuali nei modelli AS2. Per ogni candidato alla risposta, usiamo prima tecniche di somiglianza non supervisionate per estrarre frasi pertinenti dal documento sorgente, che poi inseriamo in un'architettura di trasformatore efficiente messa a punto per AS2. Il nostro approccio migliore, che sfrutta un'architettura di attenzione multidirezionale per codificare efficacemente il contesto, migliora dal 6% all'11% rispetto allo stato dell'arte non contestuale in AS2 con un impatto minimo sulla latenza del sistema. Tutti gli esperimenti in questo lavoro sono stati condotti in inglese.", 'kk': 'Жауап сөзді таңдау (AS2) деген ашық доменге сұрақ жауап беру (QA) жүйелерінің құрылымының эффективті арқылы. Құжаттан кейбір мәліметті елемеу үшін әдімгі AS2 үлгілерінің сұрақ- жауаптар жиілігін бір-біріне жеткізу үшін, әрбір мүмкін жауап берілген құжаттан кейбір мәл Әртүрлі, машиналық оқу тапсырмаларының түсініктері үшін компьютерлік үшін бір немесе бірнеше пароль келтірілген үлгілер қабылдайды. Бұл көпшілікті дұрыс түсініктеріне кө Бұл жұмыс ішінде AS2 үлгілерінде тәртіпсіздік мәліметті қосуға тәртіпсіздік. Әрбір жауап кандидаты үшін біріншіден аспапталмаған ұқсас тәсілдік техникаларын өзінің көздегі құжаттан шығару үшін қолданамыз. Содан кейін AS2 үшін эффективті түрлендіруші архитектурасына жа Біздің ең жақсы тәсіліміз, көптеген архитектураларды көптеген контексті кодтамыз үшін, AS2 жылдамдығындағы суреттің контексті күйіне шешілмеген күйінен 6% мен 11% дегенді жақсартады. Бұл жұмыстың барлық тәжірибелері ағылшынша жасалған.', 'mk': 'Изборот на одговорни реченици (AS2) е ефикасен пристап за дизајнирање на системите на отворени одговори на прашања (QA). Со цел да се постигне ниска лантенција, традиционалните модели AS2 постигнуваат парови прашања-одговори индивидуално, игнорирајќи ги сите информации од документот од кои бил изваден секој потенцијален одговор. За разлика од тоа, повеќе компјутационално скапи модели дизајнирани за машинско читање задачи за разбирање обично добиваат еден или повеќе премини како влез, што честопати резултира со подобра прецизност. Во оваа работа, претставуваме пристап за ефикасно вклучување на контекстуални информации во моделите на AS2. За секој кандидат на одговор, прво користиме ненадгледувани техники на сличност за да ги извадиме релевантните реченици од својот извор документ, кој потоа го внесуваме во ефикасна трансформаторска архитектура фино прилагодена за AS2. Нашиот најдобар пристап, кој користи мултинасочна архитектура на внимание за ефикасно кодирање на контекстот, подобрува 6 до 11 отсто над неконтекстната техничка состојба во АС2 со минимален влијание врз латенцијата на системот. Сите експерименти во оваа работа беа спроведени на англиски.', 'ka': 'პასუხი სიტყვის არჩევა (AS2) არის აფექტიური პროგრამი გახსნა დიომინის კითხვა სისტემის განსახულება (QA) განსახულება. მარტივი მარტივი მარტივი AS2 მოდელების შესახებ კითხვა-პასუხი individually, რომელიც დოკუმენტიდან ყველა პროცენტური პასუხის ინფორმაციას იგნორიცია, ყოველ პროცენ კონტრასტში, უფრო კომპუტაციურად კომპუტაციული მოდელები, რომლებიც მაქსინური კითხვის კომპონტაციის მოქმედებისთვის, რომლებიც ტიპულად ერთი ან უფრო მცირე ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ეფექტიურად კონტექსტური ინფორმაციას AS2 მოდელში ჩვენ აჩვენებთ წარმოდგენა. ყოველ პასუხისთვის კანდიდენტისთვის, ჩვენ პირველად გამოყენებთ განსხვავებული განსხვავებული ტექნოგიები, რომლებიც მისი მხოლოდ დოკუმენტისთვის გამოყენება, რომელიც შემდეგ ჩვენ AS2- ჩვენი უკეთესი პროგრამა, რომელიც მრავალური აღქტიქტურის აღქტიქტურაციას ეფექტიურად კონტექსტის კონტექსტის კონტექსტის კონტექსტურად გამოყენება, 6% დან 11% უფრო მე ყველა ექსპერიმენტები ამ სამუშაოში იყო ინგლისურად.', 'ms': 'Pemilihan Hukuman Jawab (AS2) adalah pendekatan efisien untuk desain sistem Jawab soalan domain terbuka (QA). Untuk mencapai kelemahan rendah, model AS2 tradisional skor pasangan soalan-jawapan secara individu, mengabaikan mana-mana maklumat dari dokumen setiap jawapan potensi telah dikeluarkan. Sebaliknya, model yang lebih mahal secara kira-kira direka untuk tugas pemahaman pembacaan mesin biasanya menerima satu atau lebih laluan sebagai input, yang sering menghasilkan kepekatan yang lebih baik. Dalam kerja ini, kami memperkenalkan pendekatan untuk memasukkan maklumat kontekstual secara efektif dalam model AS2. For each answer candidate, we first use unsupervised similarity techniques to extract relevant sentences from its source document, which we then feed into an efficient transformer architecture fine-tuned for AS2.  pendekatan terbaik kita, yang menggunakan arkitektur perhatian berbilang arah untuk mengekodkan konteks secara efektif, meningkatkan 6% hingga 11% atas keadaan seni bukan kontekstual dalam AS2 dengan kesan minimal pada kelemahan sistem. Semua eksperimen dalam kerja ini dilakukan dalam bahasa Inggeris.', 'ml': 'വിധി തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനു് (AS2) തുറന്ന ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം ചോദ്യം സിസ്റ്റത്തിനുള്ള ഡിസൈനിക്കുവേണ്ടിയുള് കുറച്ചു ലേറ്റെന്\u200dസിയെ എത്തിക്കാന്\u200d, പാരമ്പര്യമായ ആസ്2 മോഡലുകള്\u200d ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്ന സ്കോര്\u200d വ്യക്തിപരമായി സ്കോര്\u200d ചെയ്യുന മറ്റെന്തെങ്കിലും മെഷീന്\u200d വായിക്കുന്ന ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി വികസിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കണക്കൂടുതല്\u200d വിലയേറിയ മോഡലുകള്\u200d സാധാരണയായി  ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ആസ്2 മോഡലിലെ സാധാരണ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d ഒരു വഴിയുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. എല്ലാ ഉത്തരം പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥികന്മാര്\u200dക്കും ആദ്യം സൂക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ സോര്\u200dസ് രേഖയില്\u200d നിന്നും വാക്ക നമ്മുടെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല രീതിയില്\u200d, അത് ഒരു multi-way ശ്രദ്ധയുള്ള ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിക്കാന്\u200d സാധാരണ കോണ്\u200dകോണ്\u200dടെക്സ്റ്റെക്സ്റ്റെക്സ്റ്റെക്സ്റ്റെന്\u200dറിന്  All experiments in this work were conducted in English.', 'no': 'Svar utval av setningar (AS2) er eit effektivt tilnærming for utforming av open- domain Question Answering (QA) system. For å oppnå låg latens, var tradisjonelle AS2- modeller oppdaga spørsmål- svarpar individuelt. Ignorering av nokon informasjon frå dokumentet var kvar potensielt svar pakka ut frå. I contrast, meir computationally expensive models designed for machine reading comprehension tasks typically receive one or more passages as input, which often results in better accuracy. I dette arbeidet presenterer vi ein tilnærming til effektivt inkludert kontekstinformasjon i AS2-modeller. For kvar svarkandidat, bruker vi først uavhengige liknande teknikk for å pakka ut relevant setningar frå kjeldedokumentet sin, som vi så kjem inn i ein effektiv transformeringsarkitektur som finnstillig for AS2. Det beste tilnærminga vårt, som leverer ein fleire måtar oppmerksarkitektur for å kode konteksten effektivt, forbetrar 6 % til 11 % over ikkje-kontekst-tilstand til kunsten i AS2 med minimal effekt på systemlatensitet. Alle eksperimenter i denne arbeiden vart utført på engelsk.', 'lt': 'Atsakymų frazės parinkimas (AS2) yra veiksmingas atviro domeno atsakymų į klausimus sistemų (QA) kūrimo metodas. Siekiant pasiekti mažą latenciją, tradiciniai AS2 modeliai atskirai vertina klausimų ir atsakymų poras, ignoruodami bet kokią dokumento informaciją, iš kurios buvo gautas kiekvienas galimas atsakymas. Priešingai, skaičiavimo požiūriu brangesni modeliai, sukurti mašin ų skaitymo supratimo užduotims atlikti, paprastai gauna vieną ar daugiau įvedimų, o tai dažnai lemia geresnį tikslumą. Šiame darbe pristatome požiūrį į veiksmingą kontekstinės informacijos įtraukimą į AS2 modelius. Kiekvienam kandidatui į atsakymą pirmiausia naudojame nepastebimus panašumo metodus, kad ištrauktume atitinkamus sakinius iš jo išorinio dokumento, kuris vėliau patenka į veiksmingą transformatoriaus architektūrą, pritaikytą AS2. Mūsų geriausias požiūris, kuriuo siekiama veiksmingai koduoti kontekstą daugiašalę dėmesio struktūrą, pagerina nuo 6 % iki 11 % ne kontekstinės pažangos AS2 srityje, o tai daro minimal ų poveikį sistemos latencijai. Visi šio darbo eksperimentai buvo atlikti anglų kalba.', 'mn': 'Хариулт өгүүлбөр сонголт (AS2) нь нээлттэй холбоотой асуулт хариулт (QA) системийн загварын үр дүнтэй арга юм. Өнгөрсөн талаар бага байхын тулд, уламжлалт AS2 загварын асуулт-хариултын хоёрыг хуваалцах боломжтой хариултын тулд баримт бүрт ямар ч мэдээлэл үгүй байлаа. Харамсалтай нь машины унших үйлдлийг ойлгохын тулд машины үнэтэй загварууд нь нэг эсвэл олон загваруудыг авдаг. Энэ нь ихэвчлэн илүү тодорхойлолтой болдог. Энэ ажлын тулд бид AS2 загвараар орчин үеийн мэдээллийг бүтээмжтэй нэгтгэх арга замыг тайлбарлаж байна. Хариулт удирдагч бүрт эхлээд бид түүний эх үүсвэр баримтаас холбогдолтой өгүүлбэрүүдийг авахын тулд анхны төстэй төстэй техникуудыг ашиглаж, дараа нь бид AS2-д эерэг шилжүүлэгч архитектур болгож хувирг Бидний хамгийн шилдэг арга зам нь олон төрлийн анхаарлын архитектурыг үр дүнтэй холбогдохын тулд, AS2 дахь урлагийн байдалд орших боломжгүй байдалд 6-11%-аас бага нөлөөтэй. Энэ ажлын туршилтууд Англи хэл дээр хийгдсэн.', 'pl': 'Wybór zdań odpowiedzi (AS2) to efektywne podejście do projektowania systemów odpowiedzi na pytania otwarte w domenie (QA). Aby osiągnąć niskie opóźnienia, tradycyjne modele AS2 oceniają pary pytania-odpowiedzi indywidualnie, ignorując wszelkie informacje z dokumentu, z którego wydobywano każdą potencjalną odpowiedź. Natomiast bardziej kosztowne obliczeniowe modele przeznaczone do zadań rozumienia odczytu maszynowego zazwyczaj otrzymują jeden lub więcej fragmentów jako wejście, co często skutkuje lepszą dokładnością. W niniejszej pracy przedstawiamy podejście do efektywnego włączania informacji kontekstowych w modelach AS2. Dla każdego kandydata na odpowiedź używamy najpierw nienadzorowanych technik podobieństwa, aby wyodrębnić istotne zdania z jego dokumentu źródłowego, które następnie wprowadzamy do wydajnej architektury transformatora dostosowanej do AS2. Nasze najlepsze podejście, które wykorzystuje wielokierunkową architekturę uwagi do efektywnego kodowania kontekstu, poprawia 6% do 11% w porównaniu z niekontekstowym stanem techniki w AS2 przy minimalnym wpływie na opóźnienia systemu. Wszystkie eksperymenty w tej pracy przeprowadzono w języku angielskim.', 'si': 'උත්තර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තෝරාගන්න (AS2) කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය (QA) පද්ධතියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තෝරාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ අඩුම ප්\u200dරතිකාරය අඩුම ප්\u200dරතිකාර AS2 මොඩේල් ස්කෝර් ප්\u200dරශ්න-උත්තර ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් දෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනුවෙන්, ලිපි විරුද්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, පරිගණනය විශේෂයෙන් ගොඩක් ගොඩක් විශේෂ මොඩේල් කරලා තියෙන්නේ මැෂින් කියවන්න කාර්යාලය සමහර මේ වැඩේ අපි පරීක්ෂණයෙන් පරීක්ෂණ තොරතුරු AS2 මොඩේල් වලට සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහක් පෙන් හැම ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක්ම ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක්ම, අපි මුලින්ම ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නොප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා ඒකේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයේ ලිපිණිපත අපේ හොඳම ප්\u200dරවේශනය, ඒකෙන් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් අවධානය කරනවා සම්බන්ධතාවක් සංකේතයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න, AS2 වලින් සංකේතයේ සංවේශනයේ ස මේ වැඩේ හැම ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක්ම ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වලින් කරලා තියෙනවා.', 'mt': 'L-Għażla tas-Sentenza tat-Tweġiba (AS2) hija approċċ effiċjenti għad-disinn ta’ sistemi ta’ Tweġiba għall-Mistoqsijiet (QA) b’dominju miftuħ. Sabiex jinkiseb latenza baxxa, mudelli tradizzjonali AS2 jikklassifikaw pari ta’ mistoqsijiet-tweġibiet individwalment, filwaqt li jinjoraw kwalunkwe informazzjoni mid-dokument minn kull tweġiba potenzjali ġiet estratta. B’kuntrast ma’ dan, mudelli aktar għaljin b’mod komputattiv iddisinjati għal kompiti ta’ komprensjoni tal-qari bil-magna tipikament jirċievu passaġġ wieħed jew aktar bħala input, li spiss jirriżulta f’preċiżjoni aħjar. F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nippreżentaw approċċ biex tinkorpora b’mod effiċjenti l-informazzjoni kuntestwali fil-mudelli AS2. Għal kull kandidat għat-tweġiba, l-ewwel aħna nużaw tekniki ta’ similarità mhux sorveljati biex neħħew sentenzi rilevanti mid-dokument tas-sors tiegħu, li mbagħad nagħtu kontribut f’arkitettura effiċjenti tat-trasformatur imfassla sew għall-AS2. L-a ħjar approċċ tagħna, li jagħti spinta lil arkitettura ta’ attenzjoni multidirezzjonali biex tikkodifika b’mod effiċjenti l-kuntest, itejjeb bejn 6 % u 11 % fuq l-aħħar avvanz mhux kuntestwali fl-AS2 b’impatt minimu fuq it-latenza tas-sistema. L-esperimenti kollha f’dan ix-xogħol saru bl-Ingliż.', 'sv': 'Answer Sentence Selection (AS2) är ett effektivt tillvägagångssätt för design av open-domain frågesvarssystem (QA). För att uppnå låg fördröjning kan traditionella AS2-modeller värdera frågor-svar par individuellt, och ignorera all information från dokumentet som varje potentiellt svar extraherades från. Däremot får mer beräkningsmässigt dyra modeller som utformats för maskinläsförståelse vanligtvis en eller flera passager som inmatning, vilket ofta resulterar i bättre noggrannhet. I detta arbete presenterar vi ett tillvägagångssätt för att effektivt integrera kontextuell information i AS2-modeller. För varje svarskandidat använder vi först oövervakade likhetstekniker för att extrahera relevanta meningar från källdokumentet, som vi sedan matar in i en effektiv transformatorarkitektur finjusterad för AS2. Vårt bästa tillvägagångssätt, som utnyttjar en flervägs uppmärksamhetsarkitektur för att effektivt koda kontext, förbättrar 6% till 11% jämfört med icke-kontextuellt state of the art i AS2 med minimal påverkan på systemfördröjning. Alla experiment i detta arbete genomfördes på engelska.', 'ro': 'Selecția sentințelor de răspuns (AS2) este o abordare eficientă pentru proiectarea sistemelor de răspuns la întrebări (QA) cu domeniu deschis. Pentru a obține o latență scăzută, modelele AS2 tradiționale punctează perechile de întrebări-răspuns individual, ignorând orice informație din document din care a fost extras fiecare răspuns potențial. În schimb, modelele mai scumpe din punct de vedere computațional concepute pentru sarcini de înțelegere a citirii automate primesc de obicei unul sau mai multe pasaje ca intrare, ceea ce duce adesea la o mai bună precizie. În această lucrare, prezentăm o abordare de integrare eficientă a informațiilor contextuale în modelele AS2. Pentru fiecare candidat la răspuns, folosim mai întâi tehnici de similitudine nesupravegheate pentru a extrage propoziții relevante din documentul sursă, pe care apoi le introducem într-o arhitectură eficientă a transformatorului, reglată fin pentru AS2. Cea mai bună abordare a noastră, care utilizează o arhitectură de atenție multidirecțională pentru codificarea eficientă a contextului, îmbunătățește 6% până la 11% față de starea non-contextuală a tehnicii în AS2, cu impact minim asupra latenței sistemului. Toate experimentele din această lucrare au fost efectuate în limba engleză.', 'ur': 'جواب سنت انتخاب (AS2) کھلے ڈومین سوال جواب دینے (QA) سیستموں کے طراحی کے لئے ایک عمدہ طریقہ ہے. کم لٹینٹی کے لئے، سنتی AS2 نمڈلے سؤال-جواب جوڑے ایک دوسرے کے لئے، ہر امکانات جواب سے کسی معلومات کو نادانی کرنے کے لئے اٹھایا گیا تھا. مخالفت سے، ماشین پڑھنے کے لئے بہت زیادہ کمپیوٹریशन کے مطابق مطابق کی کمپیوٹریशन کے مطابق طراحی کی مطابق ایک یا زیادہ مسافروں کو اچھی دقیق کے نتیجے میں حاصل کرتا ہے. ہم اس کام میں ایک طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں کہ AS2 موڈل میں متوسط معلومات کو مفید طور پر شامل کریں۔ ہر جواب کاندینٹ کے لئے ہم پہلی بار اس کے سورس ڈکومکینٹ سے معاملہ فیصلہ نکالنے کے لئے غیر قابل تحقیق کی تکنیک استعمال کرتے ہیں، پھر اس کے بعد ہم AS2 کے لئے قابل تحقیق تغییر دینے والی معماری میں کھلاتے ہیں۔ ہماری بہترین طریقہ، جس نے بہت سی طریقے کی توجه کی معماری مصنوعیت کو مصنوعی طریقے کے ساتھ کوڈک کرنے کے لئے اضافہ کرتا ہے، AS2 میں هنر کی غیر متوسط موقعیت پر 6% سے 11% زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے، اس طرح سیستم لٹینٹی پر کم اث اس کام میں تمام آزمائش انگلیسی میں کیا گیا۔', 'ta': 'வாக்கியத்தின் தேர்வு (AS2) திறந்த பதில் கேள்வி முறைமைகளின் வடிவமைப்பிற்கு ஒரு விருப்பமான வழி. சிறிய அலட்சியத்தை அடைவதற்கு, மரபார்ந்த AS2 மாதிரிகள் கேள்வி விடையின் ஜோடி தனியாக மதிப்பெடுக்கும், ஒவ்வொரு சாத்தியமான விட மாறுபட்டால், இயந்திரத்தை படிக்கும் செயல்களுக்கு வடிவமைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகள் ஒரு அல்லது அதற்கு மேற்பட்ட கடவுச்செல்களை உள்ளீட்டாக பெறுகிறது,  இந்த வேலையில், AS2 மாதிரிகளில் வெற்றிகரமான தகவலை சேர்க்க ஒரு முறையை கொண்டு வருகிறோம். ஒவ்வொரு விடை தேர்வாளருக்கும், நாம் முதலில் பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத த தொழில்நுட்பத்தை பயன்படுத்தி அதன் மூல ஆவணத்திலிருந்து வாக்குகளை வெளியேற்று எங்கள் சிறந்த முறையில், அது ஒரு பல வழி கவனத்திற்கு கவனத்திற்கு கட்டுப்பாட்டை செயல்படுத்தும் குறைவாக குறைவாக குறைவாக குறைவாக விளைவுகளை கொடுக்க All experiments in this work were conducted in English.', 'sr': 'Odgovor odabranja kazne (AS2) je efikasan pristup za dizajn sistema odgovora na pitanja otvorenog domena (QA). Da bi postigli nisku latenciju, tradicionalni AS2 modeli su individualno dobili par odgovora na pitanje, ignorirajući bilo kakve informacije iz dokumenta, svaki potencijalni odgovor je izvukao. Za razliku od toga, kompjuterski skuplji modeli dizajnirani za zadatak razumevanja mašina obično primaju jedan ili više prolaza kao ulaz, što često rezultira u bolju tačnost. U ovom poslu predstavljamo pristup efikasnom uključivanju kontekstualnih informacija u AS2 modele. Za svaki kandidat odgovora, prvo koristimo neodređene tehnike sličnosti da izvučemo relevantne rečenice iz svog izvornog dokumenta, koji se onda hranimo u efikasnu transformacijsku arhitekturu koja je ispravljena za AS2. Naš najbolji pristup, koji utiče na multiputnu arhitekturu pažnje na efikasno kodiranje konteksta, poboljšava 6% na 11% preko nekontekstualnog stanja umjetnosti u AS2 sa minimalnim uticajem na sistemsku latenciju. Svi eksperimenti u ovom poslu su provedeni na engleskom.', 'so': "Doorashada xukunka garsooridda (AS2) waa qaab faa’iido ah oo u sameynta nidaamka su'aalaha furan ee gudaha (QA). Si aad u hesho ugu dhaqdhaqaaq yar, noocyada asalka ah AS2 waxaa laga soo saaray laba nooc oo jawaabta su'aalaha ah oo gaar ah, iyadoo laga tago macluumaad kasta oo warqada dukumentiga ka yimid jawaab kasta oo suurtagal ah. Isku saabsan, tusaalooyin qaali ah oo loo qoray mashiinka oo akhriska aasaasiga ah wuxuu sida caadiga ah u helaa baasaboor mid ama wax ka badan sida input oo kale, taas oo marar badan ku sababto saxda wanaagsan. In this work, we present an approach to efficiently incorporate contextual information in AS2 models.  Dhammaan kandida jawaabta, marka ugu horeysa waxaynu isticmaalnaa teknolojiyo aan isilaalinayn si aan u soo saarno erayo la xiriira oo ka soo baxa dukumentiyada sourceeda, kaas oo aynu ugu quudinnaa dhismaha beddelinta oo faa’iido ah oo aad u beddelineyso AS2. Dhacdooyinkayada ugu wanaagsan ee lagu hagaajiyaa dhismaha kaleemeyn badan oo si faa’iido ah u kooban karo, wuxuu kordhiyaa 6% ilaa 11% ka kordhiyaa xaalada farshaxanka ee AS2, taasoo saameyn ugu yaraan ku saabsan dhamaanka nidaamka. Dhammaan baaritaanka shaqadaas waxaa lagu sameeyay af Ingiriis.", 'uz': "Name Koʻproq taqdimlikni olish uchun, traditional AS2 modellari boshqa savol javob qoʻllaniladi, va hujjatdan har bir potential javob olingan. Ko'pchilikda, kompyuterni o'qish vazifalarini o'rganish uchun ko'proq qiymati modellar o'zgartiriladi, odatda bir yoki ko'proq maxfiy soʻzni kiritish mumkin. Bu ishda, biz AS2 modelidagi davomida ma'lumotni ajratishga tayyorlash usulni hozir qilamiz. Har bir javob kandida, biz birinchi tomonidan qoʻllanilmaydigan tashkilotlarni manba hujjatdan chiqarish uchun qoʻllanmiz. Keyin biz asboblar uchun tashkilotni ajratuvchi soʻzlardan foydalanamiz. Bizning eng yaxshi usuli, bu ko'pchilik foydalanuvchi muammolarning maktablarini tasavvur qiladi va tizimning eng kichkina ishlatishi uchun 6% dan 11% dan 11% dan oshadi. Bu ishdagi hamma tajribalar ingliz tilida bajarildi.", 'vi': 'Câu trả lời Phần chọn câu hỏi (AS2) là một phương pháp hiệu quả cho việc thiết kế các hệ thống Trả lời câu hỏi mở miền (QA). Để đạt được hạn chót, mẫu AS2 truyền thống ghi điểm câu hỏi-đáp từng người một, lờ đi bất cứ thông tin nào từ tài liệu mỗi câu trả lời có thể được lấy ra. Tuy nhiên, các mô hình đắt tiền hơn tính toán được thiết kế cho các công việc thấu hiểu máy thường nhận một hoặc nhiều đoạn như nhập, mà thường dẫn đến độ chính xác hơn. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi có một phương pháp để tích hợp các thông tin ngữ cảnh trong mô hình AS2. Với mỗi ứng viên câu trả lời, trước tiên chúng tôi sử dụng các kỹ thuật giống nhau không giám sát để trích các câu liên quan từ tài liệu gốc, mà sau đó chúng tôi chuyển thành một kiến trúc biến hiệu quả hoàn chỉnh cho AS2. Cách tiếp cận tốt nhất của chúng ta, vốn đã dùng một kiến trúc chú ý nhiều chiều để mã hóa ngữ cảnh hiệu quả, cải thiện 6+ tới 11+ hơn phát triển trạng thái không ngữ cảnh nghệ thuật ở AS2 với ảnh hưởng tối thiểu tới tiềm năng hệ thống. Tất cả thí nghiệm trong công trình này đều được tiến hành bằng tiếng Anh.', 'bg': 'Изборът на изречения за отговор (АС2) е ефективен подход за проектиране на системи за отговор на въпроси с отворен домейн. За да се постигне ниска латентност, традиционните модели оценяват двойките въпроси-отговори индивидуално, игнорирайки всякаква информация от документа, от който всеки потенциален отговор е извлечен. За разлика от това, по-скъпите изчислителни модели, предназначени за задачи за машинно четене, обикновено получават един или повече пасажи като вход, което често води до по-добра точност. В тази работа представяме подход за ефективно включване на контекстуалната информация в модели. За всеки кандидат за отговор първо използваме техники за подобие без надзор, за да извлечем съответните изречения от изходния му документ, които след това въвеждаме в ефективна трансформаторна архитектура, фина настройка за АС2. Най-добрият ни подход, който използва многопосочна архитектура на вниманието за ефективно кодиране на контекста, подобрява 6% до 11% в сравнение с неконтекстуалното състояние на изкуството в АС2 с минимално въздействие върху латентността на системата. Всички експерименти в тази работа са проведени на английски език.', 'da': 'Answer Sentence Selection (AS2) er en effektiv tilgang til design af open-domæne spørgsmålsbesvarelsessystemer (QA). For at opnå lav ventetid scorer traditionelle AS2-modeller spørgsmål-svar par individuelt og ignorerer alle oplysninger fra dokumentet, hvert potentielt svar blev udvundet fra. Derimod modtager mere beregningsmæssigt dyre modeller designet til maskinlæseforståelsesopgaver typisk en eller flere passager som input, hvilket ofte resulterer i bedre nøjagtighed. I dette arbejde præsenterer vi en tilgang til effektivt at indarbejde kontekstuel information i AS2 modeller. For hver svarkandidat bruger vi først uovervendte lighedsteknikker til at udtrække relevante sætninger fra kildedokumentet, som vi derefter indfører i en effektiv transformatorarkitektur finjusteret til AS2. Vores bedste tilgang, som udnytter en multi-vejs opmærksomhedsarkitektur til effektivt at kode kontekst, forbedrer 6% til 11% i forhold til ikke-kontekstuel state of te art i AS2 med minimal indvirkning på systemets ventetid. Alle eksperimenter i dette arbejde blev udført på engelsk.', 'hr': 'Odgovor izbora kazne (AS2) je učinkovit pristup dizajnu sustava odgovora na pitanja otvorenog domena (QA). Kako bi se postigla niska latencija, tradicionalni AS2 modeli su individualno dobili par odgovora na pitanje, ignorirajući bilo kakve informacije iz dokumenta, izvučeni su svaki potencijalni odgovor. Za suprotno, računalno skuplji modeli koji su dizajnirani za zadatke razumijevanja strojeva obično primaju jedan ili više prolaza kao ulaz, što često rezultira u bolju preciznost. U ovom poslu predstavljamo pristup učinkovito uključujući contextualne informacije u AS2 modele. Za svaki kandidat odgovora, prvo koristimo neodređene tehnike sličnosti da izvučemo relevantne rečenice iz svog izvornog dokumenta, kojim se onda hranimo u učinkovitu strukturu transformatora koji je ispravljena za AS2. Naš najbolji pristup, koji utiče na multiputnu arhitekturu pažnje na učinkovito kodiranje konteksta, poboljšava se 6% na 11% preko nekontekstnog stanja umjetnosti u AS2-u s minimalnim utjecajem na sistemsku latenciju. Svi eksperimenti u ovom poslu su provedeni na engleskom.', 'nl': 'Antwoord Sentence Selection (AS2) is een efficiënte aanpak voor het ontwerpen van open-domein Question Answering (QA) systemen. Om een lage latentie te bereiken, scoren traditionele AS2 modellen vraag-antwoord paren afzonderlijk, waarbij alle informatie uit het document wordt genegeerd waaruit elk mogelijk antwoord werd gehaald. Daarentegen ontvangen meer rekenkundige dure modellen die ontworpen zijn voor begrijptaken voor machinelezen meestal één of meer passages als input, wat vaak resulteert in een betere nauwkeurigheid. In dit werk presenteren we een aanpak om contextuele informatie efficiënt te integreren in AS2 modellen. Voor elke antwoordkandidaat gebruiken we eerst onbeheerde vergelijkingstechnieken om relevante zinnen uit het brondocument te halen, die we vervolgens doorvoeren in een efficiënte transformatorarchitectuur die is afgestemd op AS2. Onze beste aanpak, die gebruikmaakt van een multi-way attention architectuur om context efficiënt te coderen, verbetert 6% tot 11% ten opzichte van niet-contextuele state of the art in AS2 met een minimale impact op de systeemlatentie. Alle experimenten in dit werk werden uitgevoerd in het Engels.', 'id': 'Pemilihan Perkataan Jawaban (AS2) adalah pendekatan efisien untuk desain sistem Jawaban Pertanyaan (QA) domain terbuka. Untuk mencapai latensi rendah, model AS2 tradisional skor pertanyaan-jawaban pasangan secara individu, mengabaikan informasi apapun dari dokumen setiap potensi jawaban telah dikeluarkan dari. In contrast, more computationally expensive models designed for machine reading comprehension tasks typically receive one or more passages as input, which often results in better accuracy.  Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mempersembahkan pendekatan untuk memasukkan informasi kontekstual secara efisien dalam model AS2. Untuk setiap calon jawaban, kita pertama-tama menggunakan teknik persamaan yang tidak diawasi untuk mengekstrak kalimat relevanti dari dokumen sumbernya, yang kemudian kita makan ke arsitektur transformer efisien yang disesuaikan dengan baik untuk AS2. pendekatan terbaik kita, yang menggunakan arsitektur perhatian berbilang arah untuk mengkode konteks secara efisien, meningkatkan 6% hingga 11% atas keadaan seni non-kontekstual di AS2 dengan dampak minimal pada latensi sistem. Semua eksperimen dalam pekerjaan ini dilakukan dalam bahasa Inggris.', 'de': 'Answer Satzence Selection (AS2) ist ein effizienter Ansatz für das Design von Open-Domain Question Answering (QA)-Systemen. Um eine niedrige Latenz zu erreichen, bewerten herkömmliche AS2-Modelle Fragen-Antwort-Paare einzeln und ignorieren alle Informationen aus dem Dokument, aus dem jede mögliche Antwort extrahiert wurde. Im Gegensatz dazu erhalten rechenaufwändigere Modelle, die für maschinelles Leseverständnis entwickelt wurden, typischerweise eine oder mehrere Passagen als Eingabe, was oft zu einer besseren Genauigkeit führt. In dieser Arbeit stellen wir einen Ansatz vor, kontextbezogene Informationen effizient in AS2-Modelle zu integrieren. Für jeden Antwortkandidaten verwenden wir zunächst unbeaufsichtigte Ähnlichkeitstechniken, um relevante Sätze aus dem Quelldokument zu extrahieren, die wir dann in eine effiziente Transformatorarchitektur einspeisen, die auf AS2 abgestimmt ist. Unser bester Ansatz, der eine Multi-Wege-Aufmerksamkeitsarchitektur nutzt, um Kontext effizient zu kodieren, verbessert 6% bis 11% gegenüber dem nicht-kontextuellen Stand der Technik in AS2 mit minimalem Einfluss auf die Systemlatenz. Alle Experimente in dieser Arbeit wurden in englischer Sprache durchgeführt.', 'tr': 'Jogap Sözleme Saýlawy (AS2) açyk-domain Sorag jogap sistemleriniň taslamasynda etkinlik bir metodyr. Yüksek soňluk ýetmek üçin, däpli AS2 nusgalary indiriň soragy-jogaby çiftleri çykar, her potensial jogabyndan hiç hili maglumaty ýok etmek üçin. Maşynyň düşünmesi üçin kompýuterläk wajyp nusgalary aňsatly bir ýa-da köp geçişi girdi ýaly alýar. Bu köplenç has dogry bolýar. Bu işde, AS2 nusgalarynda çykyş şeklinde metinçe informasiýasyny etkinleýän bir nusga görkezýäris. Her hat kandidaty üçin birinji gezek çykyş teknikleri ulanýarys, munuň çeşme senediň daşary sözlerini açmak üçin, we şol sebäpli AS2 üçin etkinlik bir arhitektura üýtgedip, beýleki täsirli bir arhitektura süýtgedik. Biziň iň gowy ýagdaýymyz, multi-ýoluň üns arhitekturlygyny efektiv bir kontekste kodlamak üçin etjek, AS2-de gelen sanat täsirinde 6% we 11% üstine iň gowy gidýär. Bu işde hemme deneyler Iňlisçe edildi.', 'sw': 'Jibu Uchaguzi wa Hukumu (AS2) ni njia yenye ufanisi kwa ajili ya ubunifu wa mfumo wa swali huru wa ndani (QA). Ili kupata matumizi ya hivi karibuni ya chini, mifano ya kitamaduni ya AS2 hupandisha majibu ya maswali binafsi, wakiacha taarifa yoyote kutoka kwenye nyaraka kila jibu linalowezekana kutoka. Tofauti na hilo, mitindo ya gharama zaidi ya kompyuta zilizotengenezwa kwa ajili ya mashine ya kusoma kazi za kompyuta kwa kawaida hupokea njia moja au zaidi kama input, ambayo mara nyingi hupelekea sahihi bora. Katika kazi hii, tunaweka mbinu za kuingiza taarifa za wakati katika mifano ya AS2. Kwa kila mgombea wa majibu, kwanza tunatumia mbinu zisizo na usalama ili kuondoa hukumu zinazohusika kutoka kwenye nyaraka zake za vyanzo, ambazo baadae tunakula katika ujenzi wa mabadiliko yenye ufanisi wa kiwango cha kubadilisha kwa ajili ya AS2. Hatua yetu nzuri, ambayo inatumia ujenzi wa mtazamo wa njia mbalimbali wa kutangaza kwa ufanisi wa muktadha huo, inaongezea asilimia 6 hadi 11% zaidi ya hali isiyo ya kisasa ya sanaa ya AS2 yenye madhara ya kidogo kwa mfumo wa hivi karibuni. Majaribio yote katika kazi hii yalifanyika kwa Kiingereza.', 'ko': '답문 선택(AS2)은 개방 분야의 문답 시스템을 설계하는 효과적인 방법이다.지연 시간을 줄이기 위해 기존의 AS2 모델은 문서에서 추출한 모든 잠재적 답안을 무시하고 문제 - 답안 쌍에 대해 별도로 점수를 매깁니다.그에 비해 기계 읽기와 이해 임무를 위한 계산 원가가 높은 모델은 보통 한 단락 또는 여러 단락을 입력으로 받아들여 더욱 높은 정확성을 초래할 수 있다.이 작업에서 우리는 AS2 모델에서 상하문 정보를 효과적으로 통합하는 방법을 제시했다.각 후보 답안에 대해 우리는 먼저 감독하지 않은 유사성 기술을 사용하여 원본 문서에서 관련 문장을 추출한 다음에 AS2를 미세하게 조정하는 고효율 변환기 체계 구조에 입력한다.우리의 최선의 방법은 다방면 주의 체계 구조를 이용하여 상하문을 효율적으로 인코딩하는 것이다. AS2의 비상문 최신 기술에 비해 6%에서 11% 높아졌고 시스템 지연에 대한 영향은 가장 적다.이 작업 중의 모든 실험은 영어로 진행되었다.', 'fa': 'پاسخ برگزیدن کلمه (AS2) یک دستور موثری برای طراحی سیستم پاسخ پرسش\u200cهای دامنی باز (QA) است. برای رسیدن به نقطه پایین مدل\u200cهای سنتی AS2 جفت\u200cهای سوال و پاسخ\u200cجواب\u200cهای سنتی individually، نادیده\u200cای از هر اطلاعاتی از سند که هر پاسخ potentially از آن خارج شده است. بر خلاف این، مدل های محاسبه گرون\u200cتر برای خواندن ماشین\u200cها طراحی شده است که معمولاً یک یا بیشتر از مسیر\u200cها به عنوان ورودی دریافت می\u200cکنند، که اغلب به دقیق بهتر نتیجه می\u200cدهد. در این کار، ما یک روش برای موثرت اطلاعات متوسط را در مدل های AS2 نشان می دهیم. برای هر کاندیدای پاسخ، ما اول از تکنیک شبیه\u200cای غیرقابل استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا جمله\u200cهای مربوط به سند منبعش خارج کنیم، که بعدش به یک معماری تغییر\u200cدهنده موثر برای AS2 تغییر داده می\u200cشویم. بهترین روش ما، که یک معماری توجه بسیاری از طریق\u200cهای متفاوتی را برای محیط قابل تأکید کنترل می\u200cکند، از ۶% تا ۱۱% بر وضعیت غیر محیط هنر در AS2 بهتر می\u200cکند، با تأثیر کمترین روی محیط سیستم. تمام آزمایشات این کار با انگلیسی انجام شد.', 'af': "Antwoord Uitdrukking Keuse (AS2) is 'n effektief toegang vir die ontwerp van open- domein Vrag Antwoord (QA) stelsels. In order to achieve low latency, traditional AS2 models score question- answer pairs individual, ignoring any information from the document each potential answer was extracted from. In contrast, meer rekenaar koste modele ontwerp vir masjien lees verstandige opdragte wat tipies een of meer wagte as invoer ontvang, wat dikwels resultaat in beter presisie. In hierdie werk stel ons 'n toegang voor te stel na effektief kontekslike inligting in AS2-modelles. Vir elke antwoord kandidate, gebruik ons eerste ongespesifiseerde gelykenis teknike om relevante teikens uit sy bron dokument uit te pak, wat ons dan voer in 'n effektief transformeerder arkitektuur fyn-tuned vir AS2. Ons beste toegang, wat 'n multiweër aandag-arkitektuur verwyder om effektief konteks te kodeer, verbeter 6% tot 11% oor nie-contextual staat van die kuns in AS2 met minimale invloek op stelsel latensie. Alle eksperimente in hierdie werk is in Engels gedoen.", 'sq': 'Answer Sentence Selection (AS2) is an efficient approach for the design of open-domain Question Answering (QA) systems.  Me qëllim që të arrijë vonesë të ulët, modelet tradicionale AS2 shënojnë çifte pyetje-përgjigje individualisht, duke injoruar çdo informacion nga dokumenti që secila përgjigje potenciale u nxorr nga. Në kundërshtim, modelet më të shtrenjta llogaritësisht të dizajnuara për detyrat e kuptimit të leximit të makinave zakonisht marrin një apo më shumë pasazhe si input, që shpesh rezulton në saktësi më të mirë. Në këtë punë, ne paraqesim një qasje për të përfshirë në mënyrë të efektshme informacionin kontekstual në modelet AS2. Për secilin kandidat të përgjigjes, ne së pari përdorim teknika të ngjashme të pazgjidhura për të nxjerrë frazat e rëndësishme nga dokumenti i saj burimi, të cilat ne pastaj ushqehemi në një arkitekturë efikase transformuese të rregulluar për AS2. Përqasja jonë më e mirë, e cila nxjerr një arkitekturë vëmendjeje shumë-drejtore për të koduar me efektshmëri kontekstin, përmirëson 6% deri 11% mbi gjendjen jo-kontekstuale të artit në AS2 me ndikim minimal në latencën e sistemit. Të gjitha eksperimentet në këtë punë u kryen në anglisht.', 'am': 'የመስጠት ምርጫዎች አዲስ ቅድሚያ ለማግኘት፣ የባሕላዊው AS2 ሞዴል የጥያቄ-መልስ ሁለትን ለብቻው ይቆጥረዋል፡፡ በተለካ፣ የመሳኪን ማነብ ስራዎችን ለመቀበል የሚዘጋጁት የከበረ ሞዴላዎች በተለየ አንድ ወይም የበዛ መግቢያ እንደሚያቀበሉ፣ ብዙ ጊዜ ይሻላል፡፡ In this work, we present an approach to efficiently incorporate contextual information in AS2 models.  ለሁሉም መልስ ምናዳደር፣ አስቀድመን ሳይጠበቅ የተስማማውን ድርጊቶች ከዋና ሰነዱን ለማውጣት እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ የበለጠ ጥያቄያችን፣ የብዙ መንገዶች አካባቢ አካባቢ ሥርዓት ማድረግ እና አካባቢ ማድረግ እንዲያሳድጋል፣ በAS2 ውስጥ የጥያቄ ግንኙነት በተቃውሞ የጥናት ግንኙነት በሚያሳድገው 6 በመቶ ወደ 11 በመቶ ይሻላል፡፡ የዚህ ስራ ፈተና ሁሉ በንግግሊዝኛ ውስጥ ተደረገ፡፡', 'hy': 'Պատասխանի արտահայտությունների ընտրությունը (AS2) արդյունավետ մոտեցում է բաց տիեզերքի հարցերի պատասխանի (QA) համակարգերի դիզայնի համար: In order to achieve low latency, traditional AS2 models score question-answer pairs individually, ignoring any information from the document each potential answer was extracted from.  Դրան հակառակը, ավելի թանկ համակարգչային մոդելները, որոնք նախագծված են մեքենային կարդալու ընկալումների առաջադրանքների համար, սովորաբար ընդունում են մեկ կամ ավելի հատվածներ, ինչը հաճախ հանգեցնում է ավելի ճշգրտության: Այս աշխատանքի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի մոտեցում, որպեսզի արդյունավետ ներառենք կոնտեքստալ ինֆորմացիան AS2 մոդելների մեջ: Յուրաքանչյուր պատասխանի թեկնածու համար մենք առաջին անգամ օգտագործում ենք անվերահսկված նմանության մեթոդներ, որպեսզի հանենք նշանակալի նախադասությունները իր աղբյուր փաստաթղթից, որը հետո մենք տեղադրում ենք ԱՍ2-ի համար լավ պատրաստված արդյունավետ վերա Մեր լավագույն մոտեցումը, որը օգտագործում է բազմաուղղակի ուշադրության ճարտարապետությունը, որպեսզի արդյունավետ կոդավորի կոնտեքստը, բարելավում է 6-11 տոկոսը AS2-ի ոչ կոնտեքստալ տեխնոլոգիայի վերաբերյալ, որն ունի միմինալ ազ Այս աշխատանքի բոլոր փորձերը կատարվեցին անգլերենով:', 'bn': 'শাস্তি নির্বাচনের উত্তর (AS2) হচ্ছে উন্মুক্ত ডোমেইন প্রশ্নের উত্তর (QA) সিস্টেমের ডিজাইনের জন্য কার্যকর উপায়। কম লেটেন্সি অর্জনের জন্য, ঐতিহ্যবাহী AS2 মডেল ব্যক্তিগতভাবে প্রশ্ন-উত্তরের জোড়া স্কোর করে, নথিটি থেকে প্রত্যেক সম্ভাব্য উত্তর থ বিপরীতে, মেশিনের জন্য গণমূল্যবান মডেলের জন্য নির্ধারণ করা হয়েছে যা সাধারণত এক বা বেশী পাসপেজ ইনপুট হিসেবে পাওয়া যায়, যা প্রায়শ সঠিক হয় এই কাজের মধ্যে আমরা এক উপায় উপস্থাপন করি যাতে এস.২ মডেলে কার্যকর তথ্য অন্তর্ভুক্ত করার জন্য। প্রত্যেক উত্তর প্রার্থীর জন্য আমরা প্রথমে সংরক্ষিত সমতুল্য প্রযুক্তি ব্যবহার করি তার উৎসের নথি থেকে সংশ্লিষ্ট প্রযুক্তি বের করার জন্য, যা আমরা এস২ আমাদের সবচেয়ে ভালো উপায়, যা কার্যকর কোডের প্রতিক্রিয়ার জন্য একটি বহুরাস্তায় মনোযোগ প্রদান করে, সেখানে সিস্টেমের সামাজিক সংক্রান্ত প্রভাব ব বাড় এই কাজের সকল পরীক্ষা ইংরেজী ভাষায় অনুষ্ঠিত হয়েছে।', 'bs': 'Odgovor odabranja kazne (AS2) je efikasan pristup za dizajn sustava odgovora na pitanja otvorenog domena (QA). Da bi postigli nisku latenciju, tradicionalni AS2 modeli su individualno dobili par odgovora na pitanje, ignorirajući bilo kakve informacije iz dokumenta svaki potencijalni odgovor je izvučen iz. Za suprotno, kompjuterski skuplji modeli dizajnirani za zadatak razumijevanja strojeva obično primaju jedan ili više prolaza kao ulaz, što često rezultira u bolju preciznost. U ovom poslu predstavljamo pristup učinkovito uključujući contextualne informacije u AS2 modele. Za svaki kandidat odgovora, prvo koristimo neodređene tehnike sličnosti da izvučemo relevantne rečenice iz svog izvornog dokumenta, koji se onda hranimo u efikasnu transformacijsku arhitekturu koja je ispravljena za AS2. Naš najbolji pristup, koji utiče na multiputnu arhitekturu pažnje na efikasno kodiranje konteksta, poboljšava 6% na 11% preko nekontekstualnog stanja umjetnosti u AS2 sa minimalnim utjecajem na sistemsku latenciju. Svi eksperimenti u ovom poslu su provedeni na engleskom.', 'ca': "La selecció de frases de resposta (AS2) és un enfocament eficient per al disseny de sistemes de resposta a preguntes de domini obert. Per aconseguir baixa latencia, els models tradicionals AS2 puntueixen parells de preguntes i respostes individualment, ignorant qualsevol informació del document de la qual es va extrair cada resposta potencial. En canvi, els models més costosos computacionalment dissenyats per a tasques de comprensió de lectura màquina normalment rebuen un o més passatges com a entrada, que sovint resulta en una millor precisió. En aquesta feina, presentem un enfocament per incorporar eficientment la informació contextual als models AS2. For each answer candidate, we first use unsupervised similarity techniques to extract relevant sentences from its source document, which we then feed into an efficient transformer architecture fine-tuned for AS2.  El nostre millor enfocament, que aprofita una arquitectura d'atenció multiorientada per codificar el context eficientment, millora entre el 6% i l'11% sobre l'estat d'art no contextual de l'AS2 amb un impacte mínim en la latencia del sistema. Tots els experiments d'aquesta feina van ser fets en anglès.", 'az': 'Cevap Sözlük Seçimi (AS2) açıq-domena sual cavab verən sistemlərin tasarımı üçün faydalı bir yoldur. Daha düşük sıxıntıya gəlmək üçün, əvvəlki AS2 modellərin sual-cavab çiftlərini indir-indir, hər potensial cavabdan hər hansı bir məlumatı dərk etmək üçün. Əksinə, mašin oxuyan öyrənmə görevləri üçün müəyyən edilən daha çox hesablamlı mal modellər genellikle bir ya da çox keçiş giriş kimi alırlar, bu çox dəyişiklik daha doğruluğuna görədir. Bu işdə, AS2 modellərdə müxtəlif məlumatları yaratmaq üçün bir yol göstəririk. Hər cavab kandidatı üçün ilk dəfə istifadə edirik ki, bu cümlələri öz mənbə dökümündən çıxartmaq üçün istifadə edilməmiş bənzər teknikləri istifadə edirik, sonra da AS2 üçün müəyyən edilmiş bir transformatçı arhitektura təmin edirik. Bizim ən yaxşı tərzimiz, çoxlu yol təsiri arhitektürünü etkinlik olaraq kodlamaq üçün çoxlu tərzdə təsiri edir, AS2-də sanatın müxtəlif olmayan tərzindən 6%-11%-i daha yaxşılaşdırır. Bu işdə bütün eksperimentlər İngilizce dilində işlədilər.', 'cs': 'Výběr odpovědí (AS2) je efektivní přístup pro návrh otevřených doménových systémů pro odpovědi na otázky (QA). Aby bylo dosaženo nízké latence, tradiční AS2 modely hodnotí páry otázek-odpověď individuálně, ignorují veškeré informace z dokumentu, ze kterého byla každá potenciální odpověď extrahována. Naproti tomu výpočetně nákladnější modely určené pro úlohy porozumění strojovému čtení obvykle dostávají jednu nebo více pasáží jako vstup, což často vede k lepší přesnosti. V této práci představujeme přístup k efektivnímu začlenění kontextových informací do AS2 modelů. Pro každého kandidáta na odpověď nejprve používáme techniky podobnosti bez dohledu k extrakci relevantních vět z jeho zdrojového dokumentu, které pak vložíme do efektivní transformátorové architektury vyladěné pro AS2. Náš nejlepší přístup, který využívá vícesměrnou architekturu pozornosti k efektivnímu kódování kontextu, zlepšuje 6% až 11% oproti nekontextuálnímu stavu techniky v AS2 s minimálním dopadem na latenci systému. Všechny experimenty v této práci byly provedeny v angličtině.', 'fi': 'Vastalauseiden valinta (AS2) on tehokas lรคhestymistapa avoimen verkkotunnuksen kyselyvastausjรคrjestelmien suunnitteluun. Jotta saavutettaisiin alhainen viive, perinteiset AS2-mallit pistettรคvรคt kysymys-vastauspareja yksilรถllisesti jรคttรคen huomiotta kaikki tiedot asiakirjasta, josta jokainen mahdollinen vastaus on poimittu. Sen sijaan koneenlukun ymmรคrtรคmiseen suunnitellut laskennallisesti kalliimmat mallit saavat yleensรค yhden tai useamman kohdan syรถtteenรค, mikรค usein johtaa parempaan tarkkuuteen. Tรคssรค tyรถssรค esitellรครคn lรคhestymistapa kontekstitietojen tehokkaaseen sisรคllyttรคmiseen AS2-malleihin. Jokaisen vastausehdokkaan kohdalla kรคytรคmme ensin valvomattomia samankaltaisuustekniikoita poimimaan olennaisia lauseita lรคhdedokumentista, jotka syรถtรคmme sitten tehokkaaseen muuntajan arkkitehtuuriin, joka on hienosรครคdetty AS2:lle. Paras lรคhestymistapamme, joka hyรถdyntรครค monisuuntaista huomioarkkitehtuuria kontekstin tehokkaaseen koodaamiseen, parantaa 6โ\x80\x9311% AS2:n ei-kontekstuaaliseen nykytilaan verrattuna minimaalisella vaikutuksella jรคrjestelmรคn viiveeseen. Kaikki kokeet tรคssรค tyรถssรค tehtiin englanniksi.', 'et': 'Vastulause lause valik (AS2) on tõhus lähenemisviis avatud domeeni küsimustele vastamise (QA) süsteemide projekteerimiseks. Madala latentsuse saavutamiseks hindavad traditsioonilised AS2 mudelid individuaalselt küsimuste ja vastuste paare, ignoreerides igasugust teavet dokumendist, millest iga potentsiaalne vastus välja võeti. Seevastu masinlugemise mõistmiseks mõeldud arvutuslikumad mudelid saavad sisendina tavaliselt ühe või mitu lõiku, mille tulemuseks on sageli parem täpsus. Käesolevas töös tutvustame lähenemisviisi kontekstiteabe tõhusaks kaasamiseks AS2 mudelitesse. Iga vastuse kandidaadi puhul kasutame esmalt järelevalveta sarnasuse meetodeid, et ekstraheerida asjakohaseid lauseid lähtedokumendist, mis seejärel sisestatakse tõhusasse trafoarhitektuuri, mis on täpselt häälestatud AS2 jaoks. Meie parim lähenemisviis, mis kasutab mitmesuunalist tähelepanu arhitektuuri konteksti tõhusaks kodeerimiseks, parandab 6% kuni 11% võrreldes mittekontekstuaalse tehnika tasemega AS2, mõjutades minimaalselt süsteemi latentsust. Kõik katsed käesolevas töös viidi läbi inglise keeles.', 'jv': 'Waktung SentenceSelect (AS2) is an effectual method for the design of open-domain question Replying (qA) System. Ngubah kang nggawe kaluwargane soko slang-slang, sampeyan AS2 model sing paling-ngomong sapa-sapa batar, ingkang layang info liyane sak dokumen sing wis diputara sak cebo sing apik. Tulung bisa, akeh dumateng komputer dumateng manut sing dumateng kanggo kelangan kelangan langgar sampeyan winih Nyong nggambar iki, kita sampeyan ngerasakno kanggo nggawe informasi contextual lan model AS2. Sampeyan tanggal Pangan Ndheke sing dibutuhke, sing beraksi akeh akeh multi-maneh kanggo nguasakno kontext sing luwih hayo nggawe 6% sampek 11% dumateng liyane ora kontinuksi sing nguasakno ditambah AS2, dadi mbalke nguasakno sing wis ana Awak dhéwé éntuk sing gagalé ning inggiles.', 'he': 'בחירת גזרות תשובה (AS2) היא גישה יעילה לעיצוב מערכות תשובות לשאלות בתחום פתוח (QA). כדי להשיג לאטנציה נמוכה, דוגמנים מסורתיים AS2 קווים זוגות תשובה-שאלה באופן אישי, מתעלמים מכל מידע מהמסמך כל תשובה פוטנציאלית הווצאה ממנו. In contrast, more computationally expensive models designed for machine reading comprehension tasks typically receive one or more passages as input, which often results in better accuracy.  In this work, we present an approach to efficiently incorporate contextual information in AS2 models.  לכל מועמד לתשובה, אנו קודם משתמשים בטכניקות דמיון ללא השגחה כדי להוציא משפטים רלוונטיים ממסמך המקור שלה, שאז אנו מאכילים לתוך ארכיטקטורת משתנה יעילה מתאימה לאס.אס.2. הגישה הטובה ביותר שלנו, אשר משתמש בארכיטקטורת תשומת לב רב-כיוון לקוד היעילות הקשר, משפר 6% עד 11% על מצב האומנות לא הקונטקטיבי באס.אס.2 עם השפעה מינימלית על אוטנציה המערכת. כל הניסויים בעבודה הזאת נעשו באנגלית.', 'ha': "@ action: inmenu To, dõmin ya isa ƙara gabanin, misãlai na As2 na ƙidãya masu motsi na nau'i-su kowace kowace, idan an ƙyale wani mace daga takardar, za'a sami duk jibin masu yiwuwa daga. Kuma da tsohon, misãlai masu ƙidãya masu nau'i na ƙidãya wanda aka yi wa zanen karatun aikin matsayin mafarin karatun, sai ka motsa shawara guda ko da yawa kamar an shigar, wanda ko da yawa ke ƙara cikin tsarin. Daga wannan aikin, munã gabatar da wani matsayi dõmin mu haɗa bayani masu fasan cikin misalin A2. Yana amfani da kowane kando da ba'a tsare ba, ko kuma za mu yi amfani da kowanka technical masu daidaita zuwa duk takardan maɓallinsa, da kuma za mu ci zuwa wata shifo mai amfani da matsayin ayuka da aka tsare wa A2. Babu kyakkyawan hanyarmu, wanda ke samar da matsayin aikin multi-hanya zuwa ga muhimmin kodi, yana ƙaranci 6% zuwa 11% daga halin sanar da kuma ba'a haɗi da shi ba'a zama daidai a cikin A2, da kuma yana da kima mai ƙaranci ga muhimmin na'ura. Dukan jarrabai da ke cikin wannan aikin aka aikata Ingiriya.", 'sk': 'Izbira stavkov odgovorov (AS2) je učinkovit pristop za oblikovanje sistemov odprtega domena za odgovarjanje na vprašanja (QA). Da bi dosegli nizko latenco, tradicionalni modeli AS2 ocenjujejo pare vprašanj-odgovorov posamično, pri čemer ne upoštevajo informacij iz dokumenta, iz katerega je bil izvlečen vsak potencialni odgovor. Nasprotno pa računalniško dražji modeli, zasnovani za opravila razumevanja strojnega branja, običajno prejmejo enega ali več odlomkov kot vhod, kar pogosto povzroči boljšo natančnost. V tem delu predstavljamo pristop k učinkovitemu vključevanju kontekstualnih informacij v modele AS2. Za vsakega kandidata za odgovor najprej uporabimo tehnike podobnosti brez nadzora, da izvlečemo ustrezne stavke iz izvornega dokumenta, ki jih nato vnesemo v učinkovito transformatorsko arhitekturo, natančno nastavljeno za AS2. Naš najboljši pristop, ki izkorišča večsmerno arhitekturo pozornosti za učinkovito kodiranje konteksta, izboljša od 6% do 11% v primerjavi z nekontekstualnim stanjem tehnike v AS2 z minimalnim vplivom na latenco sistema. Vsi poskusi v tem delu so bili izvedeni v angleščini.', 'bo': 'Answer Sentence Selection (AS2) is an efficient approach for the design of open-domain Question Answering (QA) systems. To achieve low latency, traditional AS2 models score question-answer pairs individually, ignoring any information from the document each potential answer was extracted from. In contrast, computationally expensive models designed for machine reading comprehension tasks typically receive one or more passages as input, which often results in better accuracy. This is the result of higher accuracy. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ཡུལ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གྲངས་སུ་བཏོན་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཅིག་སྟོན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རེ་གནོད་པ་ཞིག་ལ་མཉམ་དུ་ཕན་ཚུལ་བྱ་རིམ་དང་ཐོག་མའི་བཟོ་རྩོམ་འབྲི་བ ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་དམིགས་གཏོང་བཟོ་བ་ཡིན་པ་ལས་ཕན་ཚུན་སྒྲིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་སྒེར་གྱི་ནང་དུ་གླེང་སྐབས་ཀྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'DISK-CSV : Distilling Interpretable Semantic Knowledge with a Class Semantic Vector', 'es': 'DISK-CSV: Destilación del conocimiento semántico interpretable con un vector semántico de clase', 'pt': 'DISK-CSV: Destilando conhecimento semântico interpretável com um vetor semântico de classe', 'ar': 'DISK-CSV: تقطير المعرفة الدلالية القابلة للتفسير باستخدام المتجه الدلالي للفئة', 'fr': 'DISK-CSV\xa0: Distiller des connaissances sémantiques interprétables avec un vecteur sémantique de classe', 'zh': 'DISK-CSV曰:以类语义向量言义', 'ja': 'DISK - CSV ：クラスセマンティックベクトルで解釈可能なセマンティック知識を抽出する', 'hi': 'DISK-CSV: एक वर्ग शब्दार्थ वेक्टर के साथ व्याख्यायोग्य शब्दार्थ ज्ञान को डिस्टिल करना', 'ru': 'DISK-CSV: Дистилляция интерпретируемых семантических знаний с помощью классового семантического вектора', 'ga': 'DISK-CSV: Eolas Séimeantach Inléirithe a Dhriogadh le Veicteoir Shéimeantach Aicme', 'el': 'Απόσταγμα ερμηνείας Σημαντικής Γνώσης με ένα Σημαντικό Διάνυσμα κλάσης', 'hu': 'DISK-CSV: Értelmezhető szemantikus tudás lepárlása osztály szemantikus vektorral', 'kk': 'DISK- CSV: Класстың семантикалық векторының білімін түрлендіруге болады', 'ka': 'DISK- CSV: კლასის Semantic Vector', 'it': 'DISK-CSV: Distillazione di conoscenze semantiche interpretabili con un vettore semantico di classe', 'ms': 'DISK-CSV: Distilling Interpretable Semantic Knowledge with a Class Semantic Vector', 'lt': 'DISK-CSV: aiškinamųjų seminių žinių skleidimas su klasės seminiais vektoriais', 'mt': 'DISK-CSV: Distillazzjoni ta’ Għarfien Semantiku Interpretabbli b’Vettur Semantiku tal-Klassi', 'mk': 'ДИСК-ЦСВ: Дестилација на интерпретабилно семантичко знаење со семантичен вектор на класата', 'no': 'DISK-CSV: Distilling Interpretable Semantic Knowledge with a Class Semantic Vector', 'pl': 'DISK-CSV: Destylowanie interpretowalnej wiedzy semantycznej za pomocą wektora semantycznego klasy', 'ro': 'DISK-CSV: Distilarea cunoștințelor semantice interpretabile cu un vector semantic de clasă', 'si': 'DISK', 'ml': 'DISK- CSV: ക്ലാസ് സെമാന്റിക് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാവുന്ന സെമാന്റിക് അറിവുമായി വിതരണം ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'so': 'DISK-CSV: Distilling Interpretable Semantic Knowledge with a Class Semantic Vector', 'sv': 'DISK-CSV: Destillering tolkningsbar semantisk kunskap med en klass semantisk vektor', 'sr': 'DISK-CSV: Razdvajanje semantičkih znanja sa semantičnim vektorom klase', 'ta': 'DISK- CSV: வகுப்பு செமான்டிக் நெறி', 'ur': 'DISK-CSV: ایک کلاس سیمنٹی ویکتور کے ساتھ تقسیم کرنے والی سیمنٹی علم', 'mn': 'DISK-CSV: Классын семантик вектор', 'uz': 'DISK- CSV: Sinf semantik vektori bilan Interpretable Semantic Knowledge Distilling', 'vi': 'DISK-CSV: Việc phân phối hiểu biết kỳ cục với con Vetor-kỳ-kỳ-kỳ-lạ hạng ưu.', 'bg': 'Дестилиране на тълкуваеми семантични знания с класов семантичен вектор', 'da': 'DISK-CSV: Destillation fortolkningsdygtig semantisk viden med en klasse semantisk vektor', 'hr': 'DISK-CSV: Razdvojivanje semantičkih znanja s semantičkim vektorom klase', 'nl': 'DISK-CSV: Distilleren van interpreteerbare semantische kennis met een klasse semantische vector', 'de': 'DISK-CSV: Destillieren von interpretierbarem semantischem Wissen mit einem semantischen Klassenvektor', 'ko': 'DISK-CSV: 클래스 의미 벡터로 해석 가능한 의미 지식 추출', 'fa': 'DISK', 'tr': 'DISK-CSV: Sınıf semantik vektörü ile karşılaştırılabilir semantik bilgi', 'sw': 'DISK-CSV: Kupoteza ufahamu wa kujitafsiri kwa Vector ya Semantic', 'am': 'DISK-CSV:', 'id': 'DISK-CSV: Distilling Interpretable Semantic Knowledge with a Class Semantic Vector', 'sq': 'DISK-CSV: Zhvendosja e njohurive Semantike të Interpretueshme me një vektor Semantik Klase', 'hy': 'ԴիՍՔ-ՍՍՎ. Տարգմանելի սեմանտիկ գիտելիքների տարբերակը դասարանի սեմանտիկ վեկտորով', 'bn': 'DISK-CSV: একটি ক্লাস সেম্যান্টিক ভেক্টর দিয়ে অনুবাদ করা সেম্যান্টিক জ্ঞান ডিস্টিলিং করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'DISK-CSV: Razdvojivanje semantičkih znanja sa semantičnim vektorom klase', 'ca': 'DISK-CSV: Destillar coneixements Semàtics Interpretables amb un vector Semàtic de classe', 'cs': 'DISK-CSV: Destilace interpretovatelných sémantických znalostí pomocí třídního sémantického vektoru', 'et': 'DISK-CSV: tõlgendatavate semantiliste teadmiste destilleerimine klassi semantilise vektoriga', 'az': 'DISK-CSV: Sınıf Semantik Vektörü ilə dəyişdirilmiş Semantik Bilim', 'af': "DISK- CSV: Verspreiding Interpretable Semantic Knowledge met 'n Klas Semantic Vector", 'fi': 'DISK-CSV: Tulkittavan semanttisen tiedon tislaaminen luokan semanttisella vektorilla', 'jv': 'DES-CSV: Distilling', 'ha': 'DiSK-SAV: Disspelling of the Translate and Semantic Cilmi with a Classic Semantic', 'sk': 'DISK-CSV: Destilacija razložljivega semantičnega znanja s semantičnim vektorjem razreda', 'bo': 'DISK-CSV: Distilling Interpretable Semantic Knowledge with a Class Semantic Vector', 'he': 'DISK-CSV: ניתוח מידע סמנטי מתפרש עם קטור סמנטי קלאסי'}
{'en': 'Neural networks (NN) applied to natural language processing (NLP) are becoming deeper and more complex, making them increasingly difficult to understand and interpret. Even in applications of limited scope on fixed data, the creation of these complex black-boxes creates substantial challenges for debugging, understanding, and generalization. But rapid development in this field has now lead to building more straightforward and interpretable models. We propose a new technique (DISK-CSV) to distill knowledge concurrently from any neural network architecture for text classification, captured as a lightweight interpretable / explainable classifier. Across multiple datasets, our approach achieves better performance than the target black-box. In addition, our approach provides better explanations than existing techniques.', 'ar': 'أصبحت الشبكات العصبية (NN) المطبقة على معالجة اللغة الطبيعية (NLP) أعمق وأكثر تعقيدًا ، مما يزيد من صعوبة فهمها وتفسيرها. حتى في التطبيقات ذات النطاق المحدود على البيانات الثابتة ، فإن إنشاء هذه "الصناديق السوداء" المعقدة يخلق تحديات كبيرة لتصحيح الأخطاء والفهم والتعميم. لكن التطور السريع في هذا المجال أدى الآن إلى بناء نماذج أكثر وضوحًا وقابلة للتفسير. نقترح تقنية جديدة (DISK-CSV) لاستخلاص المعرفة بشكل متزامن من أي بنية شبكة عصبية لتصنيف النص ، يتم التقاطها كمصنف خفيف الوزن قابل للتفسير / قابل للتفسير. عبر مجموعات بيانات متعددة ، يحقق نهجنا أداءً أفضل من الصندوق الأسود المستهدف. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، يقدم نهجنا تفسيرات أفضل من التقنيات الحالية.', 'fr': "Les réseaux de neurones (NN) appliqués au traitement du langage naturel (PNL) sont de plus en plus profonds et complexes, ce qui les rend de plus en plus difficiles à comprendre et à interpréter. Même dans les applications de portée limitée sur des données fixes, la création de ces «\xa0boîtes noires\xa0» complexes pose des défis considérables en matière de débogage, de compréhension et de généralisation. Mais le développement rapide dans ce domaine a permis de créer des modèles plus simples et plus interprétables. Nous proposons une nouvelle technique (DISK-CSV) pour distiller simultanément les connaissances de n'importe quelle architecture de réseau neuronal pour la classification de texte, capturée comme un classificateur interprétable/explicable léger. Sur plusieurs ensembles de données, notre approche atteint de meilleures performances que la boîte noire cible. De plus, notre approche fournit de meilleures explications que les techniques existantes.", 'es': 'Las redes neuronales (NN) aplicadas al procesamiento del lenguaje natural (NLP) son cada vez más profundas y complejas, lo que hace que sean cada vez más difíciles de entender e interpretar. Incluso en aplicaciones de alcance limitado en datos fijos, la creación de estas complejas «cajas negras» crea desafíos sustanciales para la depuración, la comprensión y la generalización. Sin embargo, el rápido desarrollo en este campo ha llevado ahora a la creación de modelos más sencillos e interpretables. Proponemos una nueva técnica (DISK-CSV) para extraer conocimiento simultáneamente de cualquier arquitectura de red neuronal para la clasificación de texto, capturado como un clasificador ligero interpretable/explicable. En múltiples conjuntos de datos, nuestro enfoque logra un mejor rendimiento que la caja negra objetivo. Además, nuestro enfoque proporciona mejores explicaciones que las técnicas existentes.', 'pt': 'As redes neurais (RN) aplicadas ao processamento de linguagem natural (PLN) estão se tornando mais profundas e complexas, tornando-as cada vez mais difíceis de entender e interpretar. Mesmo em aplicações de escopo limitado em dados fixos, a criação dessas “caixas pretas” complexas cria desafios substanciais para depuração, compreensão e generalização. Mas o rápido desenvolvimento neste campo levou agora à construção de modelos mais diretos e interpretáveis. Propomos uma nova técnica (DISK-CSV) para destilar conhecimento concorrentemente de qualquer arquitetura de rede neural para classificação de texto, capturado como um classificador leve interpretável/explicável. Em vários conjuntos de dados, nossa abordagem alcança melhor desempenho do que a caixa preta de destino. Além disso, nossa abordagem fornece explicações melhores do que as técnicas existentes.', 'zh': '宜用于自然语言(NLP)者神经网络(NN)正转深杂,使益难解。 虽有限之应用程序,杂黑匣子之创,亦为调泛化致大挑战。 然当领之速,今已致构更直与可解之势。 设一新术(DISK-CSV),可于一切神经网络架构中兼取知识,以行文本分类,获为轻量级者/可解分类器。 集于数,吾道得其黑盒矣。 此外,我们的方法给了比现在技术的解释。', 'ja': '自然言語処理（ NLP ）に適用されるニューラルネットワーク（ NN ）は、ますます深く複雑になり、理解と解釈がますます困難になっている。固定データの範囲が限られているアプリケーションでも、これらの複雑な「ブラックボックス」の作成は、デバッグ、理解、および一般化に大きな課題を生み出します。しかし、この分野の急速な発展は、より簡単で解釈可能なモデルを構築することにつながりました。私たちは、テキスト分類のための任意のニューラルネットワークアーキテクチャからの知識を同時に抽出するための新しい技術（ DISK - CSV ）を提案し、軽量の解釈可能/説明可能な分類子として捕捉します。複数のデータセットで、当社のアプローチはターゲットのブラックボックスよりも優れたパフォーマンスを実現します。さらに、私たちのアプローチは、既存のテクニックよりも優れた説明を提供します。', 'ru': 'Нейронные сети (NN), применяемые для обработки естественного языка (NLP), становятся все более глубокими и сложными, что делает их все более трудными для понимания и интерпретации. Даже в приложениях с ограниченной сферой применения на фиксированных данных, создание этих сложных «черных ящиков» создает существенные проблемы для отладки, понимания и обобщения. Однако быстрое развитие в этой области в настоящее время привело к созданию более простых и интерпретируемых моделей. Мы предлагаем новую методику (DISK-CSV) для одновременного извлечения знаний из любой архитектуры нейронной сети для классификации текста, захваченной как легкий интерпретируемый/объяснимый классификатор. В нескольких наборах данных наш подход обеспечивает лучшую производительность по сравнению с целевым черным ящиком. Кроме того, наш подход дает лучшие объяснения, чем существующие методы.', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण (एनएलपी) पर लागू तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (एनएन) गहरे और अधिक जटिल होते जा रहे हैं, जिससे उन्हें समझना और व्याख्या करना मुश्किल हो जाता है। यहां तक कि निश्चित डेटा पर सीमित दायरे के अनुप्रयोगों में, इन जटिल "ब्लैक-बॉक्स" का निर्माण डीबगिंग, समझ और सामान्यीकरण के लिए पर्याप्त चुनौतियां पैदा करता है। लेकिन इस क्षेत्र में तेजी से विकास ने अब अधिक सरल और व्याख्यायोग्य मॉडल बनाने के लिए नेतृत्व किया है। हम पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए किसी भी तंत्रिका नेटवर्क आर्किटेक्चर से ज्ञान को समवर्ती रूप से डिस्टिल करने के लिए एक नई तकनीक (DISK-CSV) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिसे हल्के व्याख्यायोग्य / समझाने योग्य क्लासिफायर के रूप में कैप्चर किया जाता है। एकाधिक डेटासेट में, हमारा दृष्टिकोण लक्ष्य ब्लैक-बॉक्स की तुलना में बेहतर प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है। इसके अलावा, हमारा दृष्टिकोण मौजूदा तकनीकों की तुलना में बेहतर स्पष्टीकरण प्रदान करता है।', 'ga': 'Tá líonraí néaracha (NN) a chuirtear i bhfeidhm ar phróiseáil teanga nádúrtha (NLP) ag éirí níos doimhne agus níos casta, rud a fhágann go bhfuil siad ag éirí níos deacra a thuiscint agus a léirmhíniú. Fiú nuair a chuirtear raon feidhme teoranta i bhfeidhm ar shonraí seasta, cruthaíonn cruthú na “boscaí dubha” casta seo dúshláin shuntasacha maidir le dífhabhtú, tuiscint agus ginearálú. Ach tá forbairt mhear sa réimse seo tar éis teacht ar mhúnlaí níos simplí agus níos inmhínithe a chruthú. Molaimid teicníocht nua (DISK-CSV) chun eolas a dhriogadh i gcomhthráth ó aon ailtireacht líonra néaraigh le haghaidh aicmiú téacs, arna ghabháil mar aicmitheoir éadrom inmhínithe/mínithe. Ar fud na tacair sonraí iolracha, baineann ár gcur chuige feidhmíocht níos fearr amach ná an bosca dubh sprice. Ina theannta sin, soláthraíonn ár gcur chuige mínithe níos fearr ná na teicnící atá ann cheana féin.', 'hu': 'A természetes nyelvfeldolgozásra (NLP) alkalmazott ideghálózatok (NN) egyre mélyebbek és összetettebbek, ami egyre nehezebbé teszi őket a megértésük és értelmezésük. Még a rögzített adatokon korlátozott hatókörű alkalmazások esetében is ezeknek az összetett "fekete dobozoknak" a létrehozása jelentős kihívásokat jelent a hibakeresés, a megértés és az általánosítás szempontjából. Ezen a területen azonban a gyors fejlődés most egyszerűbb és értelmezhetőbb modellek kialakításához vezetett. Egy új technikát (DISK-CSV) javasolunk, amely egyidejűleg lepárolja a tudást bármely neurális hálózati architektúrából a szövegosztályozáshoz, amelyet könnyű értelmezhető/magyarázható osztályozóként rögzítenek. Több adatkészleten keresztül megközelítésünk jobb teljesítményt ér el, mint a cél fekete doboz. Ezenkívül megközelítésünk jobb magyarázatot nyújt, mint a meglévő technikák.', 'ka': "ნეიროლური ქსელი კომპლექსიური 'შავ-ბოქსების' შექმნარება მნიშვნელოვანი გამოცდილებების შესახებ, განსხვავება და გენერალიზაციაში. მაგრამ ამ ფეხში სიჩქარე განვითარება ახლა უფრო უკეთესი და განსხვავებელი მოდელების შექმნა. ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ ახალი ტექნექტიკა (DISK-CSV) განსხვავება ვიცნობების განსხვავებას ყველა ნეიროლური ქსელის აქტიქტიქტიქტიქტიქტიქტიკის ტექსტიკის კლასიფიკაციაზე, რომელიც განსხვავებ მრავალ მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში, ჩვენი მონაცემები უკეთესი გამოყენება უკეთესი შავის კონფიგურაციაზე. დამატებით, ჩვენი პროგორმა უკეთესი განახსნა, ვიდრე არსებობს ტექნოგიები.", 'el': 'Τα νευρωνικά δίκτυα (ΝΝ) που εφαρμόζονται στην επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας (ΝLP) γίνονται όλο και πιο περίπλοκα, καθιστώντας τα όλο και πιο δύσκολο να κατανοηθούν και να ερμηνευθούν. Ακόμη και σε εφαρμογές περιορισμένου πεδίου σε σταθερά δεδομένα, η δημιουργία αυτών των σύνθετων "μαύρων κουτιών" δημιουργεί σημαντικές προκλήσεις για την αποσφαλμάτωση, την κατανόηση και τη γενίκευση. Ωστόσο, η ταχεία ανάπτυξη στον τομέα αυτό έχει οδηγήσει τώρα στη δημιουργία πιο ξεκάθαρων και ερμηνευτών μοντέλων. Προτείνουμε μια νέα τεχνική (DISK-CSV) για την ταυτόχρονη απόσταξη γνώσης από οποιαδήποτε αρχιτεκτονική νευρωνικού δικτύου για ταξινόμηση κειμένου, που αποτυπώνεται ως ένας ελαφρύς ερμηνευτικός/επεξηγηματικός ταξινομητής. Σε πολλαπλά σύνολα δεδομένων, η προσέγγισή μας επιτυγχάνει καλύτερη απόδοση από το μαύρο κουτί προορισμού. Επιπλέον, η προσέγγισή μας παρέχει καλύτερες εξηγήσεις από τις υπάρχουσες τεχνικές.', 'it': 'Le reti neurali (NN) applicate all\'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale (PNL) stanno diventando sempre più profonde e complesse, rendendole sempre più difficili da capire e interpretare. Anche in applicazioni di portata limitata su dati fissi, la creazione di queste complesse "black-box" crea sfide sostanziali per il debug, la comprensione e la generalizzazione. Ma il rapido sviluppo in questo campo ha portato ora alla costruzione di modelli più semplici e interpretabili. Proponiamo una nuova tecnica (DISK-CSV) per distillare contemporaneamente la conoscenza da qualsiasi architettura di rete neurale per la classificazione del testo, catturata come classificatore leggero interpretabile/spiegabile. Attraverso più set di dati, il nostro approccio raggiunge prestazioni migliori rispetto alla scatola nera di destinazione. Inoltre, il nostro approccio fornisce spiegazioni migliori rispetto alle tecniche esistenti.', 'lt': "Neural networks (NN) applied to natural language processing (NLP) are becoming deeper and more complex, making them increasingly difficult to understand and interpret.  Even in applications of limited scope on fixed data, the creation of these complex 'black-boxes' creates substantial challenges for debugging, understanding, and generalization.  Tačiau greitas šios srities vystymasis dabar paskatino sukurti paprastesnius ir aiškingesnius modelius. Siūlome naują metodą (DISK-CSV), skirtą vienu metu distiliuoti žinias iš bet kokios teksto klasifikavimo neuralinio tinklo architektūros, kuri laikoma lengvu aiškinamuoju ir (arba) paaiškinamuoju klasifikatoriumi. Daugelyje duomenų rinkinių mūsų požiūris siekia geresnių rezultatų nei tikslinė juoda dėžutė. Be to, mūsų požiūris teikia geresnius paaiškinimus nei esami metodai.", 'mk': 'Неуралните мрежи (НН) применети на природното обработување јазик (НЛП) стануваат сé подлабоки и покомплексни, што ги прави сé тешко да се разберат и да се толкуваат. Дури и во апликациите со ограничен опсег на фиксни податоци, создавањето на овие комплексни „црни кутии“ создава значителни предизвици за разгадување, разбирање и генерализација. Но, брзиот развој на ова поле сега доведе до изградба на поедноставни и интерпретабилни модели. Ние предложуваме нова техника (ДИСК-ЦСВ) за истовремено дистилирање на знаење од било која нервна мрежна архитектура за класификација на текст, зафатена како лесен интерпретабилен/објаснлив класификатор. Покрај многуте податоци, нашиот пристап постигнува подобра перформанса отколку црната кутија. Покрај тоа, нашиот пристап обезбедува подобри објаснувања од постојните техники.', 'kk': "Нейрондық желілер (NN) табиғи тілдерді өңдеу (NLP) үшін қолданылатын түсіндіру және түсіндіру қиын болып жатқан. Тіркелген деректерді шектелген қолданбаларда да, осы комплекс 'қара жұмыс' құрылуы жөндеу, түсіну және жалпы түсіну үшін маңызды мәселелерді жасайды. Бірақ бұл өрісте жылдам жасау қазір көмектесетін және аудармалы моделдерді құру үшін көмектеседі. Біз жаңа техника (DISK-CSV) мәтін классификациясының білімдерін біріктіру үшін кез келген невралдық желінің архитектурасынан біріктіру үшін таңдаймыз. Бұл мәтін классификациясының түсіні Бірнеше деректер қорларының арасында, біздің тәсіліміз мақсатты қара қорларынан артық істеу жеткізеді. Қосымша, біздің қасиетіміз бар технологиялардан артық түсініктемелерді таңдайды.", 'ml': "സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയശ്ചിത്രത്തിന് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d ശൃംഖലകള്\u200d (NN) ആഴത്തിലും കൂടുതല്\u200d സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണതയുമായി തീര നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന സ്കോപ്പ് പ്രയോഗങ്ങളില്\u200d പോലും 'കറുത്ത- പെട്ടികള്\u200d' സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നതിനായ പക്ഷെ ഈ വയലിലെ വേഗം വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് കൂടുതല്\u200d നേരെയും വ്യക്തമായ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പണിയുന്നതാണ്. ഒരു പുതിയ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യ (DISK-CSV) പരിജ്ഞാനം വ്യക്തമാക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ലളിതമായ വ്യക്തമാക്കുവാന്\u200d/വിശദീകരിക്കാവുന പല ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200dക്കുമിടയില്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ സമ്പാദം ലക്ഷ്യം കറുത്ത ബോക്സിനെക്കാള്\u200d ഉത്തമമായ പ്രകടനം  കൂടാതെ, നിലവിലുള്ള സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകളെക്കാള്\u200d നല്ല വിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നു.", 'ms': "Neural networks (NN) applied to natural language processing (NLP) are becoming deeper and more complex, making them increasingly difficult to understand and interpret.  Walaupun dalam aplikasi skop terbatas pada data tetap, penciptaan 'kotak-hitam' kompleks ini mencipta cabaran yang besar untuk menyahpepijat, pemahaman, dan generalisasi. Tetapi pembangunan cepat dalam bidang ini sekarang telah membawa kepada membina model yang lebih sederhana dan boleh diterangkan. Kami cadangkan teknik baru (DISK-CSV) untuk membersihkan pengetahuan secara bersamaan dari mana-mana arkitektur rangkaian saraf untuk klasifikasi teks, ditangkap sebagai klasifikasi ringan yang boleh diterangkan/boleh dijelaskan. Across multiple datasets, our approach achieves better performance than the target black-box.  In addition, our approach provides better explanations than existing techniques.", 'pl': 'Sieci neuronowe (NN) stosowane do przetwarzania języka naturalnego (NLP) stają się coraz głębsze i bardziej złożone, co sprawia, że coraz trudniej je zrozumieć i interpretować. Nawet w aplikacjach o ograniczonym zakresie na danych stałych tworzenie tych złożonych "czarnych skrzynek" stwarza istotne wyzwania dla debugowania, zrozumienia i uogólniania. Ale szybki rozwój w tej dziedzinie doprowadził teraz do budowania bardziej prostych i interpretowalnych modeli. Proponujemy nową technikę (DISK-CSV) do jednoczesnego destylowania wiedzy z dowolnej architektury sieci neuronowej do klasyfikacji tekstu, uchwyconą jako lekki klasyfikator interpretowalny/wyjaśniający. W wielu zbiorach danych nasze podejście osiąga lepszą wydajność niż docelowa czarna skrzynka. Ponadto nasze podejście zapewnia lepsze wyjaśnienia niż istniejące techniki.', 'mn': "Байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлд (NLP) хэрэглэгдсэн мэдрэлийн сүлжээг (NN) илүү гүн, илүү нарийн болж байна. Тэднийг ойлгох, илүү хэцүү болгож байна. Хязгаарлагдсан өгөгдлийн талаар хязгаарлагдсан хэрэглээнд ч эдгээр комплекс 'хар-хайрцууд' үүсгэх нь шийдвэрлэх, ойлгох, ерөнхийлөгчийн зорилго үүсгэдэг. Гэхдээ энэ салбарт хурдан хөгжлийн хөгжлийн тулд илүү шууд, илүү ойлгомжтой загварыг бүтээх болсон. Бид шинэ техник (DISK-CSV) өгөгдлийг текст хуваалцааны мэдлэг болон тайлбарлах боломжтой хэлбэрээр баригдсан мэдлэг бүтээлээс ялгах гэсэн санал өгдөг. Бидний арга баримт олон өгөгдлийн санг хар хайрцаас илүү сайн үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг. Мөн бидний арга зам нь суурилсан технологиудаас илүү сайн тодорхойлолт гаргадаг.", 'no': 'Neuralnettverk (NN) som er brukt til naturspråkshandtering (NLP) blir dypere og mer komplekse, og gjer dei vanskeleg å forstå og tolka. Sjølv i programmer med begrenset område på fast data, opprettinga av desse komplekse «svarte boksar» lagar stor utfordringar for feilsøking, forståking og generellisering. Men rask utvikling i dette feltet har no ført til å bygge enklare og tolkbare modeller. Vi foreslår ein ny teknikk (DISK-CSV) for å distillere kunnskap samtidig frå alle neuralnettverksarkitekturar for tekstklassifikasjon, som er henta som ein lett tolkbar/forklarbare klassifiserer. På fleire datasett er tilnærming vårt bedre utvikling enn målet svart boks. I tillegg tilnærminga vårt gjev betre forklaringar enn eksisterande teknikk.', 'ro': 'Rețelele neurale (NN) aplicate procesării limbajului natural (PNL) devin mai profunde și mai complexe, făcându-le din ce în ce mai dificil de înțeles și interpretat. Chiar și în aplicațiile cu domeniu limitat de aplicare pe date fixe, crearea acestor "cutii negre" complexe creează provocări substanțiale pentru depanare, înțelegere și generalizare. Dar dezvoltarea rapidă în acest domeniu a condus acum la construirea unor modele mai simple și interpretabile. Propunem o nouă tehnică (DISK-CSV) pentru distilarea simultană a cunoștințelor din orice arhitectură de rețea neurală pentru clasificarea textului, capturată ca un clasificator ușor interpretabil/explicabil. Pe mai multe seturi de date, abordarea noastră obține performanțe mai bune decât cutia neagră țintă. În plus, abordarea noastră oferă explicații mai bune decât tehnicile existente.', 'sr': 'Neuralne mreže (NN) koje su primjenjene na prirodno obrađivanje jezika (NLP) postaju dublje i kompleksnije, čineći ih sve teže razumeti i interpretirati. Čak i u aplikacijama ograničenih oblasti podataka, stvaranje ove kompleksne "crne kutije" stvara značajne izazove za debugging, razumevanje i generalizaciju. Ali brzi razvoj ovog polja sada vodi do izgradnje jednostavnijih i interpretabilnijih modela. Predlažemo novu tehniku (DISK-CSV) da odstrani znanje istovremeno od bilo koje neuronske mreže arhitekture za klasifikaciju teksta, uhvaćene kao laku težinu interpretabilnog/objašnjivog klasifikatora. Kroz više podataka, naš pristup postiže bolju izvršnost od ciljne crne kutije. Osim toga, naš pristup pruža bolje objašnjenje nego postojeće tehnike.', 'so': "Shabakada naafada (NN) ee lagu codsaday baaraandegista luqada asalka ah (NLP) waxay noqonayaan hoos iyo dhib badan, waxayna ka dhigayaan inay si adag u fahamaan oo turjumaan. Xataa codsiyada kooban ee macluumaadka saxda ah, abuuridda kooxaha 'madow-boxes' wuxuu sameeyaa dhibaatooyin muhiim ah oo ka mid ah baaqashada, waxgarashada iyo dhalashada. But rapid development in this field has now lead to building more straightforward and interpretable models.  Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa tekniko cusub (DISK-CSV) si aan aqoonta ugu kala soocno shabakadda neurada ah oo loo qoro qoraal fasax fudud/fasiri karo. Inta lagu jiro koobo macluumaad kala duduwan, dhaqdhaqaalahayagu wuxuu gaadhaa wax ka wanaagsan tababar madow. Intaas waxaa dheer in dhaqdhaqaalahayagu uu bixiyaa faa'iido ka fiican qaabilsan waxyaabaha ay jiraan.", 'si': "ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපනය (NLP) වලට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය (NN) වෙනුවෙන් ගොඩක් හා තරම් සංකෘතිය වෙනවා, ඒවා තේරුම්  සීමාවිත දත්ත සඳහා සීමාවිත ස්ථානයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තියෙනවා නම්, මේ සංශ්\u200dය 'කළු බොක්ස්' සිරුවීම සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය අභ නමුත් මේ ක්ෂේත්රයේ ඉක්මනින් විකාශ කරනවා දැන් තව සිද්ධ විකාශය සහ අනුවාර්ථ විකාශය කරන්න පු අපි අළුත් තාක්ෂණය (DISK-CSV) කියලා පාළු විශේෂණය සඳහා කිසිම න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය සංවිධානයෙන් දන්නවක් වෙනස් කරන්න පුළුවන් විද ගොඩක් දත්ත සැට් වලින්, අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය හොඳ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ලක්ෂණ බොක්ස් වලින්. ඒ වගේම, අපේ විදියට තියෙන්න තාක්ෂණය වඩා හොඳ විස්තර දෙන්න පුළුවන්.", 'ta': "இயல்பான மொழி செயல்படுத்தலுக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட நெயுரிய பிணையங்கள் (NN) ஆழமாகவும் மேலும் சிக்கலாகவும் இருக்கின்றன, அவற்றை புரிந் நிலையான தகவல் மீது வரையறுக்கப்பட்ட வடிவத்தின் பயன்பாடுகளில் கூட, இந்த சிக்கல் 'கருப்பெட்டிகள்' உருவாக்குதல் பிழைநீக்கு, புரிந்த ஆனால் இந்த புலத்தில் விரைவான வளர்ச்சி இப்போது மிகவும் நேராக மற்றும் விளக்கமான மாதிரிகளை உருவாக் We propose a new technique (DISK-CSV) to distill knowledge concurrently from any neural network architecture for text classification, captured as a lightweight interpretable/explainable classifier.  பல தரவு அமைப்புகளுக்கு மேலும், எங்கள் முன்னேற்றம் கருப்பு பெட்டியை விட சிறந்த செயல்படுத்துகிறது. மேலும், எங்கள் முறையில் இருக்கும் தொழில்நுட்பங்களை விட சிறந்த விளக்கங்களை கொடுக்கிறது.", 'ur': "نیورال نیٹورک (NN) طبیعی زبان پردازی (NLP) کے لئے استعمال کیا گیا ہے۔ ان کو سمجھنے اور تعبیر کے لئے زیادہ مشکل بنا رہا ہے۔ Even in applications of limited scope on fixed data, the creation of these complex 'black-boxes' creates substantial challenges for debugging, understanding, and generalization. لیکن اس کھیتی میں تیز توسعہ آگے بہت سیدھی اور تفسیر قابل مدل بنانے کی وجہ سے ہے۔ ہم نے ایک نوی تکنیک (DISK-CSV) کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ علم کو ہر نئورل نیٹ ورک ساختاری سے تفصیل کرے، جو تفصیل کے لئے آسان وزن کا تفصیل/تفصیل دینے والا ہے۔ بہت سی ڈاٹ سٹ کے درمیان، ہماری طریقہ سیاہ بوکس سے بہتر عمل حاصل کرتی ہے۔ اس کے علاوہ ہماری تقریبا موجود تکنیک سے بہتر توضیح دیتا ہے.", 'mt': 'In-netwerks newrali (NN) applikati għall-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali (NLP) qed isiru aktar profondi u aktar kumplessi, u dan qed jagħmilhom dejjem aktar diffiċli biex jinftiehmu u jiġu interpretati. Anki fl-applikazzjonijiet ta’ ambitu limitat fuq dejta fissa, il-ħolqien ta’ dawn il-“kaxxi sewda” kumplessi joħloq sfidi sostanzjali għad-depurazzjoni, il-fehim, u l-ġeneralizzazzjoni. Iżda l-iżvilupp rapidu f’dan il-qasam issa wassal għall-bini ta’ mudelli aktar sempliċi u interpretabbli. Aħna nipproponu teknika ġdida (DISK-CSV) biex niddistillaw l-għarfien fl-istess ħin minn kwalunkwe arkitettura tan-netwerk newrali għall-klassifikazzjoni tat-test, maqbuda bħala klassifikatur ħafif interpretabbli/spjegabbli. Permezz ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta multipli, l-approċċ tagħna jikseb prestazzjoni aħjar mill-kaxxa sewda fil-mira. Barra minn hekk, l-approċċ tagħna jipprovdi spjegazzjonijiet aħjar mit-tekniki eżistenti.', 'sv': 'Neurala nätverk (NN) som tillämpas på naturlig språkbehandling (NLP) blir djupare och mer komplexa, vilket gör dem allt svårare att förstå och tolka. Även i tillämpningar med begränsad räckvidd på fasta data skapar skapandet av dessa komplexa "svarta rutor" stora utmaningar för felsökning, förståelse och generalisering. Men den snabba utvecklingen inom detta område har nu lett till att man bygger mer okomplicerade och tolkningsbara modeller. Vi föreslår en ny teknik (DISK-CSV) för att destillera kunskap samtidigt från alla neurala nätverksarkitekturer för textklassificering, fångad som en lätt tolkningsbar/förklarad klassificering. Genom flera datauppsättningar uppnår vårt tillvägagångssätt bättre prestanda än målrutan. Dessutom ger vårt tillvägagångssätt bättre förklaringar än befintliga tekniker.', 'uz': "Name @ info Lekin bu maydondagi tez tajriba taʼminlovchi esa ko'proq va tarjima modellarni yaratishga ega bo'ladi. Biz yangi teknologiya (DISK-CSV) bilan bir xil tarmoqni matn classifikasiga qabul qiladigan light-weight fashqaruvchiga ega boʻlgan narsa tarmoqni ajratish uchun yaxshi darajadagi. Koʻp nechta maʼlumotlar tarkibida, bizning qismimiz qora qutisiga yaxshi bajarishni bajaradi. Ko'pchilik esa, bizning fikrimiz mavjud texnologidan yaxshi forklarini beradi.", 'vi': 'Các mạng thần kinh (NNN) được áp dụng cho kỹ thuật ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (Nchọc) đang ngày càng phức tạp hơn, càng khó hiểu và giải thích hơn. Thậm chí trong những ứng dụng có giới hạn trên dữ liệu cố định, việc tạo ra những "hộp đen" phức tạp này tạo ra những thử thách lớn cho việc gỡ gạc, thấu hiểu và tổng hợp. Tuy nhiên, sự phát triển nhanh chóng trong lĩnh vực này đã dẫn đến việc xây dựng những mô hình dễ hiểu hơn. Chúng tôi đề xuất một kỹ thuật mới (DISK-CSV) để chưng cất kiến thức đồng thời từ bất kỳ cấu trúc mạng thần kinh để phân loại văn bản, được ghi nhận là một phân loại nhẹ thể dịch/giải được. Trong nhiều bộ dữ liệu, phương pháp của chúng ta đạt được hiệu quả tốt hơn hộp đen đích. Hơn nữa, cách giải thích của chúng tôi tốt hơn các kỹ thuật đã có.', 'bg': 'Невровите мрежи (НН), приложени към обработката на естествения език (НЛП), стават все по-дълбоки и сложни, което ги прави все по-трудни за разбиране и интерпретиране. Дори в приложения с ограничен обхват върху фиксирани данни, създаването на тези сложни "черни кутии" създава значителни предизвикателства за отстраняване на грешки, разбиране и обобщаване. Но бързото развитие в тази област вече доведе до изграждането на по-ясни и интерпретируеми модели. Предлагаме нова техника за дестилиране на знания едновременно от всяка архитектура на невронната мрежа за класификация на текста, уловена като лек тълкуваем/обясним класификатор. Чрез множество набори от данни нашият подход постига по-добра производителност от целевата черна кутия. В допълнение, нашият подход дава по-добри обяснения от съществуващите техники.', 'da': 'Neurale netværk (NN) anvendt til naturlig sprogbehandling (NLP) bliver dybere og mere komplekse, hvilket gør dem stadig vanskeligere at forstå og fortolke. Selv i applikationer med begrænset omfang på faste data skaber oprettelsen af disse komplekse "sorte bokse" betydelige udfordringer for fejlfinding, forståelse og generalisering. Men den hurtige udvikling på dette område har nu ført til, at der opbygges mere ligetil og fortolkelige modeller. Vi foreslår en ny teknik (DISK-CSV) til samtidig at destillere viden fra enhver neural netværksarkitektur til tekstklassifikation, fanget som en let fortolkbar/forklarelig klassifikation. På tværs af flere datasæt opnår vores tilgang bedre ydeevne end målet black-box. Desuden giver vores tilgang bedre forklaringer end eksisterende teknikker.', 'de': 'Neuronale Netze (NN) für die Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache (NLP) werden immer tiefer und komplexer, wodurch sie immer schwieriger zu verstehen und zu interpretieren sind. Selbst bei Anwendungen mit begrenztem Umfang auf festen Daten stellt die Erstellung dieser komplexen "Black-Boxen" erhebliche Herausforderungen für das Debuggen, Verstehen und Verallgemeinern dar. Doch die rasante Entwicklung in diesem Bereich hat inzwischen dazu geführt, dass Modelle einfacher und besser interpretierbar sind. Wir schlagen eine neue Technik (DISK-CSV) vor, um Wissen gleichzeitig aus jeder neuronalen Netzwerkarchitektur für die Textklassifizierung zu destillieren, die als leichter interpretierbarer/erklärbarer Klassifikator erfasst wird. Über mehrere Datensätze hinweg erreicht unser Ansatz eine bessere Leistung als die Ziel-Blackbox. Darüber hinaus liefert unser Ansatz bessere Erklärungen als bestehende Techniken.', 'id': "Jaringan saraf (NN) yang diterapkan pada proses bahasa alam (NLP) semakin dalam dan lebih kompleks, membuat mereka semakin sulit untuk memahami dan menerjemahkan. Bahkan dalam aplikasi dari skop terbatas pada data tetap, penciptaan kompleks 'kotak hitam' ini menciptakan tantangan yang besar untuk debugging, pemahaman, dan generalisasi. Namun perkembangan cepat di bidang ini sekarang telah memimpin untuk membangun model yang lebih sederhana dan dapat diterjemahkan. Kami mengusulkan teknik baru (DISK-CSV) untuk menghasilkan pengetahuan secara bersamaan dari arsitektur jaringan saraf apapun untuk klasifikasi teks, ditangkap sebagai klasifikasi ringan yang dapat diterjemahkan/menjelaskan. Melalui beberapa set data, pendekatan kita mencapai prestasi yang lebih baik dari kotak hitam target. Selain itu, pendekatan kita memberikan penjelasan yang lebih baik dari teknik yang ada.", 'ko': '자연언어처리(NLP)에 응용되는 신경망(NN)은 갈수록 깊어지고 복잡해져 이해와 해석이 점점 어려워진다.고정 데이터의 유한한 범위 응용에서도 이런 복잡한 블랙박스를 만드는 것은 디버깅, 이해, 홍보에 커다란 도전을 가져올 것이다.그러나 이 분야의 급속한 발전은 현재 더욱 직관적이고 해석 가능한 모델을 세우게 되었다.우리는 텍스트 분류에 사용되는 모든 신경 네트워크 구조에서 지식을 동시에 추출할 수 있는 새로운 기술(DISK-CSV)을 제시하여 경량급 해석 가능/해석 가능 분류기로 삼았다.여러 데이터 집중에서 우리의 방법은 목표 블랙박스보다 더 좋은 성능을 실현했다.그 밖에 우리의 방법은 기존 기술보다 더 좋은 해석을 제공했다.', 'fa': 'شبکه\u200cهای عصبی (NN) برای پرداخت زبان طبیعی (NLP) عمیق\u200cتر و پیچیده\u200cتر می\u200cشوند و آنها را به شدت سخت\u200cتر درک و تعبیر می\u200cکنند. حتی در کاربردهای محدودیت بر اطلاعات ثابت، ایجاد این جعبه\u200cهای سیاه پیچیده، چالش\u200cهای زیادی برای تغییر\u200cاندازی، درک و عمومی ایجاد می\u200cکند. اما توسعه سریع در این زمینه به ساختن مدل\u200cهای ساده\u200cتر و تعبیر قابل تربیت رسیده است. ما یک تکنیک جدید (DISK-CSV) را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا دانش را با هم از هر معماری شبکه عصبی برای گروه\u200cشناسی متن جدا کند، که به عنوان یک گروه\u200cشناسی قابل تفسیر/توضیح قابل ذره\u200cای گرفته می\u200cشود. از طریق مجموعه\u200cهای اطلاعات متعدد، طریق ما به انجام بهتر از جعبه سیاه هدف رسیده است. علاوه بر این، روش ما توضیح بهتر از تکنیک های موجود را پیشنهاد می دهد.', 'nl': "Neurale netwerken (NN) toegepast op natuurlijke taalverwerking (NLP) worden steeds dieper en complexer, waardoor ze steeds moeilijker te begrijpen en te interpreteren zijn. Zelfs in toepassingen met beperkte reikwijdte op vaste data, creëert het creëren van deze complexe 'black-boxes' aanzienlijke uitdagingen voor debuggen, begrijpen en generaliseren. Maar de snelle ontwikkeling op dit gebied heeft nu geleid tot het bouwen van eenvoudigere en duidelijkere modellen. We stellen een nieuwe techniek (DISK-CSV) voor om kennis gelijktijdig te distilleren uit elke neurale netwerkarchitectuur voor tekstclassificatie, vastgelegd als een lichtgewicht interpreteerbare/verklarbare classificator. In meerdere datasets bereikt onze aanpak betere prestaties dan de target black box. Daarnaast geeft onze aanpak betere uitleg dan bestaande technieken.", 'sw': "Mitandao ya kiserikali (NN) yanayotumika katika upasuaji wa lugha asilia (NLP) yanakuwa ya kina na tatizo zaidi, na yanawafanya kuwa vigumu kuelewa na kutafsiri. Hata katika matumizi mipaka ya taarifa maalumu, kutengenezwa kwa 'boksi hizi ngumu' hutengeneza changamoto kubwa kwa ajili ya kuteketeza, kuelewa na kutengeneza. Lakini maendeleo ya haraka katika uwanja huu sasa yamesababisha kujenga mifano ya moja kwa moja na yenye tafsiri. Tunazipendekeza teknolojia mpya (DISK-CSV) kuelezea maarifa kwa wakati wote kutoka katika ujenzi wowote wa mtandao wa neurali kwa ajili ya kutanganisha maandishi, ulioandaliwa kama mwangaza wa kutafsiri/kuelezea. Katika seti mbalimbali za taarifa, mbinu zetu hupata ufanisi bora kuliko boksi nyeusi. Zaidi ya hayo, mbinu yetu inatoa maelezo bora kuliko mbinu zilizopo.", 'af': "Neurale netwerke (NN) wat aan natuurlike taal-prosessering (NLP) aangepas word, word dieper en meer kompleks, maak hulle verminder moeilik om te verstaan en uittel. Selfs in toepassings van beperkte omvang op vaste data, skep van hierdie komplekse 'swart- boxes' skep substantiele uitdagings vir ontfouting, verstanding en generellisering. Maar vinnige ontwikkeling in hierdie veld het nou gelei om meer eenvoudige en uittelbare modele te bou. Ons voorstel 'n nuwe teknikkie (DISK-CSV) om kennis saamstig te verstrooi van enige neurale netwerk arkitektuur vir teks klasifikasie, gevang as 'n liggewig uitleggbare/verduidelik klassifiseerder. By veelvuldige datastelle, ons toegang bereik beter prestasie as die doel swart- boks. In addition, our approach provides better explanations than existing techniques.", 'am': "የነዌብ መረብ (NN) ለፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል (NLP) ጥልቅ እና በተጨማሪም ሆኖአል፣ ማስተዋልም እና መተረጉም ይጨምሩባቸዋል፡፡ በተጨማሪው ዳታዎች ላይ በተደረገ መጠቀሚያ ውስጥ እንኳን፣ እነዚህን 'ጥቁር-box' መፍጠር ለጥሰት፣ ማስተዋል እና ማቀናቀል የውጤት ጥያቄዎችን መፍጠር ያስችላል፡፡ ነገር ግን ፈጥኖ የዚህ መሬት ግንኙነት አግኝቷል፡፡ አዲስ ቴክኖክን (DISK-CSV) እናስታውቃለን፡፡ በብዙ ዳታተሮች ላይ ግንኙነታችን ጥቁር-box ይልቅ የተሻለ የድምፅ ውጤት ያገኛል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የሥርዓታችን ስህተት ከመኖሪያው ሀብት ይልቅ የሚሻል ትርጓሜዎችን ይሰጣል፡፡", 'hr': "Neuralne mreže (NN) primjenjene na prirodnu obradu jezika (NLP) postaju dublje i kompleksnije, čineći ih sve teže razumijeti i interpretirati. Čak i u primjenama ograničenog opsega na fiksnim podacima, stvaranje te kompleksne 'crne kutije' stvara značajne izazove za debugging, razumijevanje i generalizaciju. Ali brzi razvoj ovog polja sada doveo je do izgradnje jednostavnijih i interpretabilnijih modela. Predlažemo novu tehniku (DISK-CSV) da istovremeno razlikuje znanje od bilo kojeg arhitektura neuronske mreže za klasifikaciju teksta, koja je uhvaćena kao lagana interpretacija/objašnjavajuća klasifikacija. Kroz više podataka, naš pristup postiže bolji učinkovit od ciljne crne kutije. Osim toga, naš pristup pruža bolje objašnjenje nego postojeće tehnike.", 'tr': "Dogaty dil işlemegine uygulanan näral şebekeler (NLP) has baglanyşyp barýar, olary düşünmek we terjime etmek üçin has kynlaşdyrýar. Hatda sabit maglumaty barada çykylýan sahypalarda hem bu sarp 'gara-boxes' döredilmesi üçin aýlanma, düşünmeniň we umumy bejermek üçin örän kynçylyklar döredir. Emma bu ýerde tiz ösüşiklik bolup şu wagt täzeden aňsatlyk we terjime edibil nusgalary gurar. Biz Täze bir tekniki (DISK-CSV) bilen metin klasifikasy üçin näyral şebeke arhitektiriýasyndan geçirmek üçin täze bir teknik tekniki teklip berýäris. Bu şekilde yüngül terjime edilebilir/düşündirbilýän klasifikatçy bolup alýar. Birnäçe veri setirlerinden geçirip, biziň ýaryşymyz şu maksadyň gara gutusyndan gowy etkinlik ýetişir. Munuň ýagdaýymyz bolan tekniklerden has gowy düşündirişler saýlaýar.", 'bn': "Neural networks (NN) applied to natural language processing (NLP) are becoming deeper and more complex, making them increasingly difficult to understand and interpret.  এমনকি নির্ধারিত তথ্যের উপর সীমিত স্কোপের অ্যাপ্লিকেশনে এই সমস্ত কমপ্লিক্স 'কালো বক্স' তৈরি করা হয়েছে ডিবাগ, বুঝতে পারে এবং সাধ কিন্তু এই ক্ষেত্রের দ্রুত উন্নয়ন এখন আরো সোজা এবং ব্যাখ্যাত মডেল তৈরি করেছে। আমরা একটি নতুন প্রযুক্তি (DISK-CSV) প্রস্তাব করেছি যাতে যে কোন নিউরুল নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামো থেকে জ্ঞান বিভক্ত করা যায়, যার ফলে টেক্সপ্লাফিকেশনের জন্ বেশ কিছু ডাটাসেটের পাশে, আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা লক্ষ্য কালো বাক্সের চেয়ে ভালো কাজ অর্জন করে। এছাড়াও, আমাদের প্রযুক্তি বিদ্যমান প্রযুক্তির চেয়ে ভালো ব্যাখ্যা দেয়।", 'hy': 'Նյարդային ցանցերը (ՆՆ), որոնք կիրառվում են բնական լեզվի վերամշակում (ՆԼՊ), ավելի խորը և բարդ են դառնում, դարձնելով դրանք ավելի դժվար հասկանալ և մեկնաբանել: Նույնիսկ հաստատուն տվյալների վրա սահմանափակ մասշտաբի ծրագրերում, այս բարդ «սև արկղերի» ստեղծման մեծ մարտահրավեր է առաջացնում ձախողման, հասկանալու և ընդհանուր ընթացքում: Բայց այս ոլորտում արագ զարգացումը հիմա հանգեցրեց ավելի պարզ և մեկնաբանելի մոդելների կառուցմանը: We propose a new technique (DISK-CSV) to distill knowledge concurrently from any neural network architecture for text classification, captured as a lightweight interpretable/explainable classifier.  Բազմաթիվ տվյալների համակարգերի միջոցով մեր մոտեցումը ավելի լավ արդյունք է ստանում, քան նպատակային սևամորթ արկղը: Ավելին, մեր մոտեցումը ավելի լավ բացատրություն է տալիս, քան գոյություն ունեցող տեխնիկաները:', 'az': "NLP təbiətli dil işləməsinə uyğun nöral ağları (NN) daha derin və daha kompleks olar, onları anlamaq və yorumlamaq üçün daha çətin edər. Bu kompleks 'siyah qutuqların' yaradılması çətinliklərdə də çox çətinliklər yaradır. Amma bu sahədə hızlı gelişim artıq daha düzgün və çətinlikli modellər in şa edir. Biz yeni bir tekniki (DISK-CSV) təklif edirik ki, hər hansı bir nöral a ğ arhitektarından mətn klasifikasiyası üçün elmi ayırmaq üçün, çətinliklə yoxlayaraq/açıq-aydın klasifikatçı olaraq alınmış. Birçox verilən qutuların arasında, bizim tərəfimiz məqsəd siyah qutusundan daha yaxşı performans edər. Əvvəlcə, bizim tərəfimiz mevcut tekniklərdən daha yaxşı açıqlama sağlar.", 'sq': "Neural networks (NN) applied to natural language processing (NLP) are becoming deeper and more complex, making them increasingly difficult to understand and interpret.  Even in applications of limited scope on fixed data, the creation of these complex 'black-boxes' creates substantial challenges for debugging, understanding, and generalization.  But rapid development in this field has now lead to building more straightforward and interpretable models.  Ne propozojmë një teknikë të re (DISK-CSV) për të distiluar njohurinë në të njëjtën kohë nga çdo arkitekturë rrjeti nervor për klasifikimin e tekstit, të kapur si një klasifikues i lehtë interpretueshëm/të shpjegueshëm. Across multiple datasets, our approach achieves better performance than the target black-box.  Përveç kësaj, qasja jonë ofron shpjegime më të mira se teknikat ekzistuese.", 'cs': 'Neurální sítě (NN) aplikované na zpracování přirozeného jazyka (NLP) se stávají hlubšími a složitějšími, čímž je čím dál těžší porozumět a interpretovat. Dokonce i v aplikacích omezeného rozsahu na pevná data vytváření těchto složitých "černých skříňek" představuje značné problémy pro ladění, porozumění a zobecnění. Rychlý vývoj v této oblasti však nyní vedl k vytvoření přímočarějších a interpretovatelnějších modelů. Navrhujeme novou techniku (DISK-CSV) pro současnou destilaci znalostí z jakékoliv architektury neuronové sítě pro klasifikaci textu, zachycenou jako lehký interpretovatelný/vysvětlitelný klasifikátor. Napříč několika datovými sadami dosahuje náš přístup lepšího výkonu než cílová černá skříňka. Navíc náš přístup poskytuje lepší vysvětlení než stávající techniky.', 'et': 'Looduskeele töötlemisele rakendatavad närvivõrgud (NN) muutuvad sügavamaks ja keerukamaks, muutes neid üha raskemaks mõista ja tõlgendada. Isegi fikseeritud andmete piiratud ulatusega rakendustes tekitab nende keerukate mustkastide loomine märkimisväärseid probleeme silumiseks, arusaamiseks ja üldistamiseks. Kuid kiire areng selles valdkonnas on nüüd viinud lihtsamate ja tõlgendatavamate mudelite loomiseni. Pakume välja uue tehnika (DISK-CSV), et destilleerida samaaegselt teadmisi mis tahes neurovõrgu arhitektuurist teksti klassifitseerimiseks, mis on jäädvustatud kerge tõlgendatava/selgitatava klassifitseerijana. Mitme andmekogumi puhul saavutab meie lähenemisviis parema jõudluse kui eesmärgiks olev must kast. Lisaks annab meie lähenemisviis paremaid selgitusi kui olemasolevad tehnikad.', 'bs': 'Neuralne mreže (NN) koje su primjenjene na prirodnu obradu jezika (NLP) postaju dublje i kompleksnije, čineći ih sve težim razumijevanju i tumačenju. Čak i u aplikacijama ograničenih podataka o fiksnim podacima, stvaranje ove kompleksne "crne kutije" stvara značajne izazove za debagaciju, razumijevanje i generalizaciju. Ali brzi razvoj na ovom polju sada vodi do izgradnje jednostavnijih i interpretabilnijih modela. Predlažemo novu tehniku (DISK-CSV) da odstrani znanje istovremeno od bilo kojeg arhitektura neuronske mreže za klasifikaciju teksta, koja je uhvaćena kao lagana interpretacija/objašnjavajuća klasifikacija. Kroz više podataka, naš pristup postiže bolju izvršnost od ciljne crne kutije. Osim toga, naš pristup pruža bolje objašnjenje nego postojeće tehnike.', 'fi': 'Luonnonkielen käsittelyyn (NLP) sovellettavat hermoverkot (NN) syvenevät ja monimutkaistuvat, minkä vuoksi niitä on yhä vaikeampi ymmärtää ja tulkita. Jopa rajoitetuissa kiinteiden tietojen sovelluksissa näiden monimutkaisten mustien laatikoiden luominen luo merkittäviä haasteita virheenkorjaukseen, ymmärtämiseen ja yleistämiseen. Alan nopea kehitys on kuitenkin nyt johtanut yksinkertaisempien ja ymmärrettävien mallien rakentamiseen. Ehdotamme uutta tekniikkaa (DISK-CSV), jolla voidaan tislata tietoa samanaikaisesti mistä tahansa neuroverkkoarkkitehtuurista tekstin luokitteluun, joka on tallennettu kevyeksi tulkittavaksi/selitettäväksi luokittelijaksi. Lähestymistapamme saavuttaa useita datakokonaisuuksia paremman suorituskyvyn kuin tavoitemusta laatikko. Lisäksi lähestymistapamme antaa parempia selityksiä kuin nykyiset tekniikat.', 'ca': 'Les xarxes neuronales (NN) aplicades al processament natural de llenguatges (NLP) s\'estan tornant cada cop més profundes i complexes, dificultant cada cop més d\'entendre i interpretar. Fins i tot en aplicacions de portada limitada a dades fixes, la creació d\'aquestes complexes "caixes negres" crea desafiaments substancials per a la depuració, la comprensió i la generalització. But rapid development in this field has now lead to building more straightforward and interpretable models.  Proposem una nova tècnica (DISK-CSV) per distillar el coneixement simultàniament de qualsevol arquitectura de xarxa neural per la classificació de text, capturada com un classificador lleuger interpretable/explicable. A través de múltiples conjunts de dades, el nostre enfocament aconsegueix millor rendiment que la caixa negra. A més, el nostre enfocament proporciona millors explicacions que tècniques existents.', 'jv': 'Network (NN) kang dipunangé kanggo perusahaan anyar lengkang (NLP) kang isih luwih karo akeh apik lan luwih akeh komplikasi, nggawe kuwi susahe kanggo ngerasakno karo akeh ujaran. Tulung kanggo aplikasi sistem limiting kanggo mbalke data yang pisan, nggawe \'boxes-box\' sing komplikasi nganggo perbudhakan kanggo ndelok, ngwisalakno lan kelangan kelangan iki Wis We proposal a new tekque (DEsK-CSV) to Distll knowings concludly from all Neral network architecture for text CLASS, Capted as a candy-shaped/informable CLASS. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nambah, dadi kanggo dianteksi sing luwih apik kanggo teknik sing isih sabanjuré.', 'ha': "Shiryoyin neural (NN) sun yi applied to an aiki da harshen zaman shawara (NLP) yana kasa ƙari da kuma mafi tsanani, kuma yana sanya su an ƙara yin fahimtar da fassarar. Haƙĩƙa, cikin shirin ayuka masu yin ƙunci a kan data masu daidaita, an ƙiƙiro waɗannan masu 'boxen-baƙi' yana ƙara wa masu muhimu wa yin bugo, hankali, kuma mai ƙiƙiro. Amma kiyãyen kasi a cikin wannan field yana ƙara wa ka samun misãlai masu safa da fassarawa. Tune buɗe wani techni na daban (DiSK-SAV) dõmin ya rarraba ilmi yanzu daga duk matsayin tarakiki na neural wa mai rarraba matsayin, wanda aka kãma shi kamar wani mai fassarwa mai sauƙi da fassarar da/mai bayyana shi. Ko cikin tsarin danne masu yawa, hanyoyinmu yana sãmun mafiya alhẽri ga aikin aiki daga boxen wata baƙi. Da wannan, hanyarmu yana fassarar mafiya alhẽri daga misãlai wanda ke cikin.", 'sk': 'Živčna omrežja (NN), ki se uporabljajo za obdelavo naravnega jezika (NLP), postajajo globlje in kompleksnejša, zaradi česar jih je vse težje razumeti in interpretirati. Tudi v aplikacijah omejenega obsega na fiksnih podatkih ustvarjanje teh kompleksnih "črnih škatlic" ustvarja velike izzive za odpravljanje napak, razumevanje in posploševanje. Vendar je hiter razvoj na tem področju zdaj vodil k oblikovanju bolj enostavnih in razložljivih modelov. Predlagamo novo tehniko (DISK-CSV) za sočasno destilacijo znanja iz katere koli arhitekture nevronskega omrežja za klasifikacijo besedila, zajeto kot lahek razložljiv klasifikator. V več naborih podatkov naš pristop dosega boljšo učinkovitost od ciljnega črnega polja. Poleg tega naš pristop ponuja boljše pojasnila kot obstoječe tehnike.', 'bo': "ནུས་པ་དབུས་དྲ་བ(NN)ནི་རང་བཞིན་ཡུལ་གྱི་སྐད་ཆ་ལས་སྦྱོར་ལ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་ཡོད། Even in applications of limited scope on fixed data, the creation of these complex 'black-boxes' requires heavy difficulties for debugging, understanding, and generalization. འོན་ཀྱང་། ད་ལྟ་བུའི་ཁྲོད་ལམ་འདིའི་ནང་གི་གོང་འཕེལ་འགྲོ་བཞིན་གྱིས་མ་ཟད་པ་ཞིག་ཏུ་གཏོང We propose a new technique (DISK-CSV) to distill knowledge concurrently from any neural network architecture for text classification, captured as a lightweight interpretable/explainable classifier. ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྡུད་ཚན་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཏུ་འགྲོ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ནི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནག་ཏུ་ཉེན་ཁ་ཡོད་པ། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་དེ་གནས་ཡོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཤེས་ཀྱི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཆེད་དུ་རེད།", 'he': 'רשתות נוירוליות (NN) שהופעות לעבודת שפת טבעית (NLP) נעשות עמוקות יותר ויותר מורכבות, מה שעושה אותן קשות יותר ויותר להבין ולהפרש. אפילו באמצעות היישומים של ספקופ מוגבל על נתונים קבועים, יצירת הקופסאות השחורות המורכבות האלה יוצרת אתגרים משמעותיים לפגיעה, הבנה וגנרליזציה. But rapid development in this field has now lead to building more straightforward and interpretable models.  We propose a new technique (DISK-CSV) to distill knowledge concurrently from any neural network architecture for text classification, captured as a lightweight interpretable/explainable classifier.  באמצעות קבוצות מידע מרובות, הגישה שלנו משיגה ביצועים טובים יותר מהתיבת השחורה המטרה. בנוסף, הגישה שלנו מספקת הסברים טובים יותר מאשר טכניקות קיימות.'}
{'en': 'Attention Can Reflect Syntactic Structure (If You Let It)', 'ar': 'يمكن أن يعكس الانتباه البنية النحوية (إذا سمحت بذلك)', 'pt': 'A atenção pode refletir a estrutura sintática (se você deixar)', 'fr': "L'attention peut refléter la structure syntaxique (si vous le laissez)", 'es': 'La atención puede reflejar la estructura sintáctica (si se lo permites)', 'zh': '注意可以言语法结构(若许之)', 'ru': 'Внимание может отражать синтаксическую структуру (если вы позволите ей)', 'ja': 'アテンションは構文構造を反映することができます（任せる場合）', 'hi': 'ध्यान वाक्यात्मक संरचना को प्रतिबिंबित कर सकता है (यदि आप इसे जाने देते हैं)', 'ga': 'Is féidir leis an Aire Struchtúr Comhréire a Léiriú (Má Ligeann Tú é)', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Η προσοχή μπορεί να αντανακλά τη συντακτική δομή (αν το αφήσετε)', 'hu': 'A figyelem tükrözheti a szintaktikus struktúrát (ha hagyod)', 'it': "L'attenzione può riflettere la struttura sintattica (se lo lasci)", 'kk': 'Қарастыру синтактикалық құрылғыны қайталауға болады (Егер рұқсат етсеңіз)', 'mk': 'Внимание може да ја одрази синтактичката структура (ако дозволите)', 'lt': 'Atkreipimas gali atspindėti sintaktinę struktūrą (jei leidžiate)', 'ms': 'Perhatian Boleh Refleksi Struktur Sintaktik (Jika Anda Biarkan)', 'mt': 'L-attenzjoni tista’ tirrifletti l-istruttura sintattika (jekk tħalliha)', 'no': 'Attensjon kan refleksera syntaksisk struktur (viss du la det)', 'pl': 'Uwaga może odzwierciedlać strukturę syntaktyczną (jeśli na to pozwolisz)', 'ro': 'Atenția poate reflecta structura sintactică (dacă o lași)', 'ml': 'ശ്രദ്ധിക്കാന്\u200d സിന്\u200dടാക്ടിക് സ്ട്രോക്ടിക് പ്രതിക്ഷേപിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു (നിങ്ങള്\u200d അന', 'mn': 'Хэрэв та үүнийг зөвшөөрөх боломжтой болно.', 'sr': 'Pažnja može preuzeti sintaktičku strukturu (ako ga pustiš)', 'si': 'අවධානය පුළුවන් වාක්ෂික සංවිධානය ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරන්න (ඔබ ඒක අවස්ථාව කරනවනම්)', 'sv': 'Uppmärksamhet kan reflektera syntaktisk struktur (om du låter det)', 'ta': 'கவனம் ஒத்திசைவு அமைப்பை பிரதிபலிக்கலாம் (நீங்கள் அனுமதித்தால்)', 'so': 'Dhaqaalaha waxaa ka fiirsan kara dhismaha Syntactic (Haddii aad iska daahdo)', 'ur': 'توجه سینٹکتیک ساختاری (اگر آپ اسے اجازت دے سکتے ہیں)', 'vi': 'Chú ý Có thể phản xạ cấu trúc cú pháp (Nếu bạn cho phép)', 'uz': 'Name', 'nl': 'Aandacht kan syntactische structuur reflecteren (als u het laat)', 'hr': 'Pažnja može preuzeti sintaktičku strukturu (ako ga pustite)', 'bg': 'Вниманието може да отрази синтактичната структура (ако го позволите)', 'de': 'Aufmerksamkeit kann syntaktische Struktur reflektieren (wenn Sie es zulassen)', 'da': 'Opmærksomhed kan reflektere syntaktisk struktur (hvis du lader det)', 'ko': '주의력은 문법 구조를 반영할 수 있다. (네가 허락한다면)', 'sw': 'Tazama Inaweza Reflect Muundo wa Syntactic (Kama utaruhusu)', 'fa': 'Name', 'id': 'Perhatian Bisa Refleksi Struktur Sintaktik (Jika Anda membiarkannya)', 'sq': 'Vëmendja mund të reflektojë strukturën sintaktike (nëse e lejoni)', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Attention Can Reflect Syntactic Structure (If You Let It)', 'tr': 'Sintaktik strukturuny (Eger izin verseňiz)', 'bs': 'Pažnja može preuzeti sintaktičku strukturu (ako ga pustiš)', 'af': 'Aangaande Kan Sintaktika Struktuur Verwyder (As jy Laat dit)', 'bn': 'মনোযোগ প্রদান করতে পারে সিন্ট্যাকটিক কাঠামো প্রতিক্রিয়া (যদি আপনি এটি প্রদান করেন)', 'ca': "L'atenció pot reflexionar l'estructura sintàctica (si ho permetes)", 'hy': 'Ուշադրություն կարող է արտացոլում սինտակտիկ կառուցվածքը (Եթե թույլ տաք)', 'et': 'Tähelepanu võib peegeldada süntaktilist struktuuri (kui sa lased sel)', 'fi': 'Huomio voi heijastaa synteettistä rakennetta (jos annat sen)', 'cs': 'Pozornost může odrážet syntaktickou strukturu (pokud ji necháte)', 'jv': 'Attribute Gak Njalakno Ketok Sistem Sentraksi (Ndepo Drongen Terusani)', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'sk': 'Pozornost lahko odraža sintaktično strukturo (če ji dovolite)', 'he': 'תשומת לב יכולה לשקף מבנה סינטקטי (אם אתה נותן לזה)', 'bo': 'Attention Can Reflect Syntactic Structure (If You Let It)'}
{'en': 'Since the popularization of the Transformer as a general-purpose feature encoder for NLP, many studies have attempted to decode linguistic structure from its novel multi-head attention mechanism. However, much of such work focused almost exclusively on English   a language with rigid word order and a lack of inflectional morphology. In this study, we present decoding experiments for multilingual BERT across 18 languages in order to test the generalizability of the claim that dependency syntax is reflected in attention patterns. We show that full trees can be decoded above baseline accuracy from single attention heads, and that individual relations are often tracked by the same heads across languages. Furthermore, in an attempt to address recent debates about the status of attention as an explanatory mechanism, we experiment with fine-tuning mBERT on a supervised parsing objective while freezing different series of parameters. Interestingly, in steering the objective to learn explicit linguistic structure, we find much of the same structure represented in the resulting attention patterns, with interesting differences with respect to which parameters are frozen.', 'ar': 'منذ تعميم المحول باعتباره مشفرًا للأغراض العامة للغة البرمجة اللغوية العصبية ، حاولت العديد من الدراسات فك تشفير البنية اللغوية من آلية الانتباه الجديدة متعددة الرؤوس. ومع ذلك ، ركز الكثير من هذا العمل بشكل حصري تقريبًا على اللغة الإنجليزية - لغة ذات ترتيب كلمات صارم ونقص في التشكل التصريف. في هذه الدراسة ، نقدم تجارب فك تشفير لـ BERT متعدد اللغات عبر 18 لغة من أجل اختبار قابلية تعميم الادعاء بأن بناء جملة التبعية ينعكس في أنماط الانتباه. نظهر أنه يمكن فك تشفير الأشجار الكاملة فوق دقة خط الأساس من رؤوس الانتباه الفردية ، وأن العلاقات الفردية غالبًا ما يتم تتبعها من قبل نفس الرؤوس عبر اللغات. علاوة على ذلك ، في محاولة لمعالجة النقاشات الأخيرة حول حالة الانتباه كآلية تفسيرية ، قمنا بتجربة ضبط mBERT على هدف تحليل خاضع للإشراف أثناء تجميد سلسلة مختلفة من المعلمات. ومن المثير للاهتمام ، عند توجيه الهدف لتعلم البنية اللغوية الصريحة ، أن نجد الكثير من نفس البنية ممثلة في أنماط الانتباه الناتجة ، مع وجود اختلافات مثيرة للاهتمام فيما يتعلق بالمعلمات التي يتم تجميدها.', 'pt': 'Desde a popularização do Transformer como um codificador de recursos de uso geral para PNL, muitos estudos tentaram decodificar a estrutura linguística de seu novo mecanismo de atenção multi-cabeça. No entanto, grande parte desse trabalho se concentrou quase exclusivamente no inglês – um idioma com ordem de palavras rígida e falta de morfologia flexional. Neste estudo, apresentamos experimentos de decodificação para BERT multilíngue em 18 idiomas para testar a generalização da afirmação de que a sintaxe de dependência é refletida nos padrões de atenção. Mostramos que árvores completas podem ser decodificadas acima da precisão da linha de base a partir de cabeças de atenção únicas e que as relações individuais são frequentemente rastreadas pelas mesmas cabeças em todos os idiomas. Além disso, em uma tentativa de abordar debates recentes sobre o status da atenção como um mecanismo explicativo, experimentamos o ajuste fino do mBERT em um objetivo de análise supervisionada enquanto congelamos diferentes séries de parâmetros. Curiosamente, ao direcionar o objetivo de aprender a estrutura linguística explícita, encontramos muito da mesma estrutura representada nos padrões de atenção resultantes, com diferenças interessantes em relação aos parâmetros que são congelados.', 'fr': "Depuis la vulgarisation du Transformer en tant que codeur de caractéristiques à usage général pour la PNL, de nombreuses études ont tenté de décoder la structure linguistique à partir de son nouveau mécanisme d'attention multi-têtes. Cependant, la plupart de ces travaux se sont concentrés presque exclusivement sur l'anglais, une langue dont l'ordre des mots est rigide et où la morphologie flexionnelle est absente. Dans cette étude, nous présentons des expériences de décodage pour le BERT multilingue dans 18 langues afin de tester la généralisabilité de l'affirmation selon laquelle la syntaxe de dépendance se reflète dans les modèles d'attention. Nous montrons que les arbres complets peuvent être décodés au-delà de la précision de base à partir de têtes d'attention uniques, et que les relations individuelles sont souvent suivies par les mêmes têtes dans toutes les langues. En outre, pour tenter de répondre aux récents débats sur le statut de l'attention en tant que mécanisme explicatif, nous expérimentons le réglage fin du mBerT sur un objectif d'analyse supervisée tout en gelant différentes séries de paramètres. Il est intéressant de noter qu'en orientant l'objectif d'apprendre une structure linguistique explicite, nous trouvons une grande partie de la même structure représentée dans les modèles d'attention qui en résultent, avec des différences intéressantes en ce qui concerne les paramètres figés.", 'es': 'Desde la popularización del Transformer como codificador de funciones de propósito general para PNL, muchos estudios han intentado decodificar la estructura lingüística de su novedoso mecanismo de atención multicabezal. Sin embargo, gran parte de ese trabajo se centró casi exclusivamente en el inglés, un idioma con un orden de palabras rígido y una falta de morfología de inflexión. En este estudio, presentamos experimentos de decodificación para BERT multilingüe en 18 idiomas con el fin de probar la generalización de la afirmación de que la sintaxis de dependencia se refleja en los patrones de atención. Demostramos que los árboles completos se pueden decodificar por encima de la precisión de referencia desde cabezas de atención individuales, y que las relaciones individuales a menudo son rastreadas por las mismas cabezas en todos los idiomas. Además, en un intento de abordar los debates recientes sobre el estado de la atención como mecanismo explicativo, experimentamos con el ajuste fino de mBert en un objetivo de análisis supervisado mientras se congelan diferentes series de parámetros. Curiosamente, al dirigir el objetivo de aprender la estructura lingüística explícita, encontramos gran parte de la misma estructura representada en los patrones de atención resultantes, con diferencias interesantes con respecto a qué parámetros se congelan.', 'ja': 'NLPの汎用特徴エンコーダとしてTransformerが普及して以来、多くの研究がその新規の多頭注目メカニズムから言語構造を解読しようと試みてきた。 しかし、そのような仕事の多くは、ほとんど英語のみに焦点を当てていました。英語は、語順が硬く、曲がりくねった形態素が欠如している言語です。 この研究では、依存構文が注意パターンに反映されているという主張の一般化性をテストするために、18の言語にわたる多言語BERTのデコード実験を提示します。 完全な木は、単一の注意ヘッドからベースラインの精度を上回ってデコードすることができ、個々の関係は、言語間で同じヘッドによって追跡されることが多いことを示しています。 さらに、説明的なメカニズムとしての注意の状態に関する最近の議論に対処するために、異なる一連のパラメータを凍結しながら、監視された構文解析目標でmBERTを微調整することを実験しました。 興味深いことに、明示的な言語構造を学習する目的を誘導する際に、私たちは、結果として生じる注意パターンで表されるのと同じ構造の多くを見つけ、どのパラメータが凍結されるかに関して興味深い違いがあります。', 'zh': '自Transformer为NLP通用特征编码器普及以来,多所研究,从其新颖多头注意机制解码言语结构。 然大抵此类殆尽于英语 - 一有严词序,与无屈折之语。 于此论之,18多言BERT之解码实验,以试恃语法在意模之可推广性。 明全树可以注意解码过于基线精,而单于跨语之相同头踵也。 此外为近意解机之争,试于监解析微调mBERT,同时冻结异参数系列。 有趣者,导学显式言语结构之时,见意模中多同结构,并于何参数冻结之异。', 'hi': 'एनएलपी के लिए एक सामान्य उद्देश्य सुविधा एन्कोडर के रूप में ट्रांसफॉर्मर के लोकप्रियकरण के बाद से, कई अध्ययनों ने अपने उपन्यास बहु-सिर ध्यान तंत्र से भाषाई संरचना को डीकोड करने का प्रयास किया है। हालांकि, इस तरह के अधिकांश काम लगभग विशेष रूप से अंग्रेजी पर केंद्रित थे - कठोर शब्द क्रम के साथ एक भाषा और इन्फ्लेक्शनल आकृति विज्ञान की कमी। इस अध्ययन में, हम 18 भाषाओं में बहुभाषी BERT के लिए डिकोडिंग प्रयोगों को प्रस्तुत करते हैं ताकि दावे की सामान्यता का परीक्षण किया जा सके कि निर्भरता वाक्यविन्यास ध्यान पैटर्न में परिलक्षित होता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि पूर्ण पेड़ों को एकल ध्यान सिर से बेसलाइन सटीकता से ऊपर डीकोड किया जा सकता है, और यह कि व्यक्तिगत संबंधों को अक्सर भाषाओं में एक ही सिर द्वारा ट्रैक किया जाता है। इसके अलावा, एक व्याख्यात्मक तंत्र के रूप में ध्यान की स्थिति के बारे में हाल ही में बहस को संबोधित करने के प्रयास में, हम मापदंडों की विभिन्न श्रृंखलाओं को फ्रीज करते हुए एक पर्यवेक्षित पार्सिंग उद्देश्य पर ठीक-ट्यूनिंग mBERT के साथ प्रयोग करते हैं। दिलचस्प बात यह है कि स्पष्ट भाषाई संरचना सीखने के उद्देश्य को स्टीयरिंग करने में, हम परिणामस्वरूप ध्यान पैटर्न में प्रतिनिधित्व की जाने वाली एक ही संरचना को पाते हैं, जिसमें दिलचस्प अंतर होते हैं, जिसके संबंध में पैरामीटर जमे हुए हैं।', 'ru': 'С момента популяризации Трансформатора как универсального кодера признаков для NLP, многие исследования пытались декодировать лингвистическую структуру из его нового многоголового механизма внимания. Однако большая часть такой работы была сосредоточена почти исключительно на английском языке — языке с жестким порядком слов и отсутствием инфлективной морфологии. В этом исследовании мы представляем эксперименты по декодированию для многоязычного BERT на 18 языках, чтобы проверить обобщаемость утверждения о том, что синтаксис зависимости отражается в паттернах внимания. Мы показываем, что полные деревья могут быть декодированы с точностью выше базовой от одной головы внимания, и что индивидуальные отношения часто отслеживаются одними и теми же головами между языками. Кроме того, в попытке рассмотреть недавние дебаты о статусе внимания как пояснительного механизма, мы экспериментируем с точной настройкой mBERT на контролируемой цели синтаксического анализа, замораживая различные серии параметров. Интересно, что, направляя цель изучения явной лингвистической структуры, мы находим большую часть той же структуры, которая представлена в результирующих паттернах внимания, с интересными различиями в отношении того, какие параметры заморожены.', 'ga': 'Ó rinneadh tóir ar an gClaochladán mar ionchódóir gné ginearálta do NLP, tá iarracht déanta ag go leor staidéar struchtúr teanga a dhíchódú óna mheicníocht aird ilcheann úrnua. Dhírigh go leor d’obair den sórt sin ar an mBéarla beagnach go hiomlán, áfach — teanga a raibh ord docht na bhfocal inti agus easpa moirfeolaíochta infhillte. Sa staidéar seo, cuirimid i láthair turgnaimh díchódaithe do BERT ilteangach thar 18 dteanga chun ginearáltacht an maíomh go bhfuil comhréir spleáchais le feiceáil i bpatrúin aird a thástáil. Léirímid gur féidir crainn iomlána a dhíchódú os cionn cruinneas na bunlíne ó chinn aird aonair, agus go ndéantar caidreamh aonair a rianú go minic ag na cinn chéanna trasna teangacha. Ina theannta sin, mar iarracht dul i ngleic le díospóireachtaí le déanaí faoi stádas an aird mar mheicníocht mhínithe, déanaimid triail le mBERT a mhionchoigeartú ar chuspóir parsála maoirsithe agus sraitheanna éagsúla paraiméadair á reo againn. Is ábhar spéise é, agus an cuspóir á stiúradh againn chun struchtúr sainráite teanga a fhoghlaim, feicimid go leor den struchtúr céanna léirithe sna patrúin aird a eascraíonn as, agus difríochtaí suimiúla ann maidir leis na paraiméadair a reoitear.', 'el': 'Μετά την δημοσιοποίηση του μετασχηματιστή ως κωδικοποιητή χαρακτηριστικών γενικής χρήσης για πολλές μελέτες έχουν επιχειρήσει να αποκωδικοποιήσουν τη γλωσσική δομή από τον νέο μηχανισμό προσοχής πολλαπλών κεφαλών. Ωστόσο, μεγάλο μέρος αυτής της εργασίας επικεντρώθηκε σχεδόν αποκλειστικά στην αγγλική γλώσσα με άκαμπτη τάξη λέξεων και έλλειψη μορφολογίας καμπής. Στην παρούσα μελέτη, παρουσιάζουμε πειράματα αποκωδικοποίησης για πολυγλωσσικό BERT σε 18γλώσσες προκειμένου να εξετάσουμε τη γενικότητα του ισχυρισμού ότι η σύνταξη εξάρτησης αντανακλάται στα μοτίβα προσοχής. Δείχνουμε ότι τα πλήρη δέντρα μπορούν να αποκωδικοποιηθούν πάνω από την ακρίβεια βάσης από μεμονωμένες κεφαλές προσοχής και ότι οι μεμονωμένες σχέσεις συχνά παρακολουθούνται από τις ίδιες κεφαλές σε όλες τις γλώσσες. Επιπλέον, σε μια προσπάθεια να αντιμετωπιστούν οι πρόσφατες συζητήσεις σχετικά με την κατάσταση της προσοχής ως επεξηγηματικού μηχανισμού, πειραματιζόμαστε με τον συντονισμό του σε έναν εποπτευμένο στόχο ανάλυσης ενώ παγώνουμε διαφορετικές σειρές παραμέτρων. Το ενδιαφέρον είναι ότι στην καθοδήγηση του στόχου της εκμάθησης ρητής γλωσσικής δομής, βρίσκουμε μεγάλο μέρος της ίδιας δομής που αντιπροσωπεύεται στα προκύπτουσα μοτίβα προσοχής, με ενδιαφέρουσες διαφορές ως προς τις παραμέτρους που παγώνουν.', 'ka': 'ტრანფორმაციის პოლუგარიზაცია როგორც საერთო მიზეზი ფუნქციის კოდირებით NLP-ისთვის, ბევრი კვლევები მოცდილობენ ლენგურისტიკური სტრუქტურაციას, რომელიც მისი პრომე მაგრამ ასეთი სამუშაო მნიშვნელოვანი სამუშაო უფრო გამოყენებულია ანგლისურად - სიტყვების სიტყვების შესახებ და ინფლექციონალური მორფოლოგიის ამ კვლევაში, ჩვენ მრავალენგური BERT-ის განსხვავებული ექსპერიმენტების განსხვავება 18 ენების განსხვავებაში, რომლებიც განსხვავებული სინტაქსის განსხვავებაში გამოყენება. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ყველა ხე შეიძლება აკოდისტურება ერთი გრძნობის თავიდან, და რომ ინდივებული გრძნობები ზოგჯერ იგივე თავიდან იყოს იგივე თავიდან ენათ დამატებით, ახლა ახლა განსხვავებული განსხვავებული პარამეტრების სერიო შემდეგ განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავებული მონაცემენტის შესახებ გავაკეთებთ მBERT-ს განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავებ საინტერესოდ, საკუთარი გოგონისტიკური სტრუქტურაციას ვისწავლოთ, ჩვენ იგივე სტრუქტურაციას, რომელსაც პრამეტრები მოცემულია, რომელსაც მოცემულია.', 'hu': 'Mióta a Transformer népszerűsítette az NLP általános célú funkciókódolóját, számos tanulmány megpróbálta dekódolni a nyelvi struktúrát az új, többfejű figyelem mechanizmusából. Azonban az ilyen munkák nagy része szinte kizárólag az angolra összpontosított - egy merev szósorrendű nyelvre és az inflektuális morfológia hiányára. Ebben a tanulmányban 18 nyelven bemutatjuk a többnyelvű BERT dekódolási kísérleteit annak érdekében, hogy teszteljük az állítás általánosíthatóságát, miszerint a függőség szintaxisa tükröződik a figyelemmintákban. Megmutatjuk, hogy a teljes fák az alap pontossága felett dekódolhatók egyetlen figyelemfejből, és hogy az egyes kapcsolatokat gyakran ugyanazok a fejek követik nyelveken át. Továbbá a figyelem mint magyarázó mechanizmus állapotáról szóló közelmúltbeli viták megvitatására kísérletezünk az mBERT finomhangolásával egy felügyelt elemzési célkitűzésen, miközben különböző paramétersorozatokat befagyasztunk. Érdekes módon a kifejezett nyelvi struktúra megtanulásának célkitűzése irányításában ugyanannak a struktúrának nagy részét találjuk, amelyet az eredményekből eredő figyelemmintákban képviselnek, érdekes különbségekkel, amelyek tekintetében a paraméterek fagyasztottak.', 'lt': 'Atsižvelgiant į tai, kad Transformuotojas populiarinamas kaip NLP bendrojo tikslo koduotojas, daugelis tyrimų bandė dekoderuoti kalbinę struktūrą iš naujo daugiapakopio dėmesio mechanizmo. Vis dėlto daugelis tokių darbų daugiausia dėmesio skyrė beveik išimtinai anglų kalbai - kalbai su griežta žodžių tvarka ir nepakankamai inflekcinės morfologijos. Šiame tyrime pristatome daugiakalbių BERT dekodizavimo eksperimentus 18 kalbų, siekiant išbandyti teiginio, kad priklausomybės sintaksas atspindi dėmesio modelius, generalizavimą. Mes rodome, kad visus medžius galima dekodiuoti virš bazinio tikslumo iš vienos dėmesio galvutės ir kad atskirus santykius dažnai seka tos pačios galvutės įvairiose kalbose. Be to, bandydami išspręsti neseniai vykusias diskusijas dėl dėmesio būklės kaip paaiškinimo mechanizmo, eksperimentuojame tiksliai pritaikydami mBERT prie prižiūrimos analizės tikslo, užšaldant įvairius parametrus. Įdomu, kad vadovaujantis tikslu mokytis aiškios kalbos struktūros, susiduriame su didele dalimi tos pačios struktūros, kuri atsiranda dėl gaunamo dėmesio modelio, ir įdomūs skirtumai, kokių parametrų atšaldymo atžvilgiu.', 'mk': 'Since the popularization of the Transformer as a general-purpose feature encoder for NLP, many studies have attempted to decode linguistic structure from its novel multi-head attention mechanism.  Сепак, голем дел од ваквата работа се фокусираше речиси исклучително на англискиот јазик - јазик со строг редослед на зборови и недостаток на инфекционална морфологија. Во оваа студија, претставуваме експерименти за декодирање на мултијазичниот БЕРТ преку 18 јазици со цел да ја тестираме генерализацијата на тврдењето дека синтаксијата на зависноста е рефлектирана во моделите на внимание. Покажуваме дека целосните дрвја можат да бидат декодирани над основната точност од единствени глави на внимание, и дека индивидуалните односи честопати се следат од истите глави преку јазиците. Покрај тоа, во обид за решавање на неодамнешните дебати за статусот на вниманието како објаснувачки механизам, експериментираме со финетизирање на mBERT на надгледувана објектива за анализирање додека замрзнуваме различни серии параметри. Интересно, во управувањето со целта да се научи експлицитна лингвистичка структура, најдовме многу од истата структура претставена во резултатите на образите на внимание, со интересни разлики во врска со кои параметри се замрзнати.', 'it': "Dopo la diffusione del Transformer come codificatore di funzionalità generale per NLP, molti studi hanno tentato di decodificare la struttura linguistica dal suo nuovo meccanismo di attenzione multi-testa. Tuttavia, gran parte di questo lavoro si concentrò quasi esclusivamente sull'inglese - una lingua con rigido ordine delle parole e una mancanza di morfologia inflessionale. In questo studio, presentiamo esperimenti di decodifica per BERT multilingue in 18 lingue al fine di testare la generalizzabilità dell'affermazione che la sintassi di dipendenza si riflette nei modelli di attenzione. Mostriamo che gli alberi pieni possono essere decodificati al di sopra della precisione di base da singole teste di attenzione e che le singole relazioni sono spesso tracciate dalle stesse teste attraverso le lingue. Inoltre, nel tentativo di affrontare i recenti dibattiti sullo stato dell'attenzione come meccanismo esplicativo, sperimentiamo con la messa a punto di mBERT su un obiettivo di analisi supervisionato, congelando diverse serie di parametri. È interessante notare che, nel guidare l'obiettivo di apprendere una struttura linguistica esplicita, troviamo gran parte della stessa struttura rappresentata nei modelli di attenzione risultanti, con interessanti differenze rispetto a quali parametri vengono congelati.", 'kk': 'Трансформацияны NLP үшін жалпы мақсатты функциялық кодері ретінде бірнеше зерттеулер тілдік құрылғысын романдағы көп басып қарау механизмінен декодтауға тырысқан. Бірақ бұл жұмыс көпшілігі ағылшын тіліне көмектеседі - тілі сияқты сөздердің реті және инффекциялық морфологиясы жоқ. Бұл зерттеулерде, біз бірнеше тілді BERT үшін бірнеше тілді декодтау тәжірибелерін 18 тілде көрсеткіземіз. Ол тәуелдік синтаксисінің көбіректігін тексеру үшін, тәуелдік синтаксис Біз толық ағаштарды негізгі жолдың дұрыстығынан декодтауға болады, және әрбір қатынастар тілдерден бірдей бағалап тұрады. Қосымша, жаңа дебаттарды түсініктеме механизмі ретінде түсініктеме күйіне қатынау әрекетінде, мBERT бақылау мақсатын бақылап тұрып, әртүрлі параметрлер тізбегін мұздырып тұрып тұрамыз. Ең қызықты, тілдік құрылымын оқыту мақсатын басқару үшін біз бірнеше құрылымызды қалай параметрлердің мұзылған түрлендіріліктері болып тұрады.', 'mt': 'Minħabba l-popolarizzazzjoni tat-Transformer bħala kodifikatur ta’ karatteristiċi ta’ skop ġenerali għall-NLP, ħafna studji ppruvaw jiddekodaw l-istruttura lingwistika mill-mekkaniżmu ġdid ta’ attenzjoni b’ħafna ras. Madankollu, ħafna minn dawn ix-xogħlijiet iffukaw kważi esklussivament fuq l-Ingliż - lingwa b’ordni riġida tal-kliem u nuqqas ta’ morfoloġija inflettjonali. F’dan l-istudju, qed nippreżentaw esperimenti ta’ dekodifikazzjoni għal BERT multilingwi fuq 18-il lingwa sabiex tittestja l-ġeneralizzazzjoni tal-affermazzjoni li s-sintaks tad-dipendenza huwa rifless fix-xejriet ta’ attenzjoni. Aħna nuru li s-siġar sħaħ jistgħu jiġu dekodifikati ’l fuq mill-preċiżjoni tal-linja bażi minn kapijiet ta’ attenzjoni individwali, u li r-relazzjonijiet individwali spiss jiġu segwiti mill-istess kapijiet bejn il-lingwi. Barra minn hekk, f’tentattiv li nindirizzaw dibattiti reċenti dwar l-istatus tal-attenzjoni bħala mekkaniżmu ta’ spjegazzjoni, a ħna ninsperimentaw bl-aġġustament tal-mBERT fuq objettiv ta’ analiżi sorveljat filwaqt li nffriżaw serje differenti ta’ parametri. Interessant, fit-tmexxija tal-għan li titgħallem struttura lingwistika espliċita, isibu ħafna mill-istess struttura rappreżentata fix-xejriet ta’ attenzjoni li jirriżultaw, b’differenzi interessanti fir-rigward ta’ liema parametri huma ffriżati.', 'no': 'Siden populariseringa av Transformeren som eit generell funksjonskode for NLP, har mange studier prøvd å dekode lingviske strukturen frå den romanske fleire hovudmerksmekanismen. Men mykje av slike arbeid fokuserte nesten eksklusivt på engelsk - eit språk med sterke ordordrekkefølgje og mangelse av infleksjonelle morfologi. I denne studien presenterer vi dekoderingseksperimenter for fleirspråk BERT på 18 språk for å testa generelliserte tiltak til at avhengighetssyntaksen er reflektert i oppmerksmønsteret. Vi viser at fulle trær kan dekoderast over grunnlinje nøyaktighet frå enkelte oppmerkskoplar, og at individuelle forholdet ofte blir spora av same koplar over språk. I tillegg til å prøve å handtera nyleg debattar om oppmerksomhetsstatusen som ein forklaringsmekanisme, eksperimenterer vi med fint mBERT på eit oversikt tolkingsverktål medan det fryser ulike serie parametra. I å styra målet for å lære eksplisitt lingvisk struktur, finn vi mykje av det same strukturen som er representert i dei resulterte oppmerksmønstrene, med interessante forskjeller om kva parametrar er frosert.', 'ms': 'Sejak popularisasi Transformer sebagai pengekod ciri-ciri-tujuan umum untuk NLP, banyak kajian telah cuba untuk menyahkod struktur bahasa dari mekanisme perhatian berbilang-kepala novelnya. Bagaimanapun, kebanyakan pekerjaan seperti itu fokus hampir eksklusif pada bahasa Inggeris - bahasa dengan perintah perkataan yang ketat dan kekurangan morfologi pengaruh. Dalam kajian ini, kami mempersembahkan percubaan penyahkodan untuk BERT berbilang bahasa melalui 18 bahasa untuk menguji keseluruhan pernyataan bahawa sintaks dependensi tersembunyi dalam corak perhatian. Kami menunjukkan bahawa pokok penuh boleh dihapuskan atas ketepatan asas dari kepala perhatian tunggal, dan bahawa hubungan individu sering dikesan oleh kepala yang sama melalui bahasa. Selain itu, dalam cubaan untuk mengatasi debat baru-baru ini mengenai status perhatian sebagai mekanisme penjelasan, kami eksperimen dengan memperbaiki mBERT pada objek penghuraian yang diawasi semasa membeku seri parameter yang berbeza. Menarik, dalam mengarahkan objektif untuk belajar struktur bahasa secara eksplicit, kita mendapati banyak struktur yang sama yang mewakili dalam corak perhatian yang berasal, dengan perbezaan yang menarik terhadap parameter yang dibekukan.', 'ml': 'ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dമാരുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന് ശേഷം NLP-നുള്ള ഒരു ജനറല്\u200d ലക്ഷ്യം കോഡോര്\u200d ആയി പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന് ശേഷം, പല പഠനങ്ങളും  എന്നാലും ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d ഒരുപാട് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പണിയുണ്ടാക്കിയിരുന്നു. ഒരു വാക്കിന്റെ ഉത്തരവുമുള്ള ഭാഷ, അതിന ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d 18 ഭാഷകളില്\u200d പല ഭാഷയിലും ബെര്\u200dട്ടിന്റെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. ആശ്രയിച്ച സിന്\u200dടാക നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു മുഴുവന്\u200d വൃക്ഷങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ബെസ്ലൈനില്\u200d നിന്നും ശ്രദ്ധ കാണിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുമെന്ന്. വ അതിനുശേഷം, അടുത്ത വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സ്ഥിതിയെക്കുറിച്ച് സംസാരിക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്ന ഒരു വിശദീകരണവിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d മെബ വ്യക്തമായ ഭാഷ ക്രമീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കാനുള്ള ലക്ഷ്യം നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നമുക്ക് അതേ ഘടനയില്\u200d പ്രതിനിധിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരേപോലെയുള്ള കൂടുതല്\u200d കാണാം,', 'ro': 'De la popularizarea Transformerului ca codificator de caracteristici generale pentru PNL, multe studii au încercat să decodeze structura lingvistică din noul său mecanism de atenție multi-cap. Cu toate acestea, o mare parte din aceste lucrări s-a concentrat aproape exclusiv pe engleză - o limbă cu ordine rigidă a cuvintelor și o lipsă de morfologie inflexională. În acest studiu, prezentăm experimente de decodare pentru BERT multilingv în 18 limbi pentru a testa generalizarea afirmației că sintaxa dependenței se reflectă în modelele de atenție. Noi arătăm că copacii plini pot fi decodați deasupra acurateții de bază din capete de atenție unice și că relațiile individuale sunt adesea urmărite de aceleași capete în toate limbile. Mai mult decât atât, în încercarea de a aborda dezbaterile recente despre statutul atenției ca mecanism explicativ, experimentăm cu ajustarea fină a mBERT pe un obiectiv de analizare supravegheat, în timp ce înghețăm diferite serii de parametri. Interesant este că, în direcția obiectivului de a învăța structura lingvistică explicită, găsim o mare parte din aceeași structură reprezentată în modelele de atenție rezultate, cu diferențe interesante în ceea ce privește parametrii care sunt înghețați.', 'pl': 'Od czasu popularyzacji transformatora jako kodera cech ogólnego przeznaczenia dla NLP, wiele badań próbowało odszyfrować strukturę językową z jego nowego mechanizmu uwagi wielogłowicowego. Jednak duża część takich prac skupiała się niemal wyłącznie na języku angielskim sca o sztywnym porządku słów i braku morfologii inflekcyjnej. W niniejszym opracowaniu przedstawiamy eksperymenty dekodowania wielojęzycznego BERT w 18-językach w celu sprawdzenia uogólnienia twierdzenia, że składnia zależności znajduje odzwierciedlenie we wzorcach uwagi. Pokazujemy, że pełne drzewa mogą być dekodowane ponad dokładnością bazową z pojedynczych głów uwagi, a poszczególne relacje są często śledzone przez te same główki w różnych językach. Ponadto, próbując odnieść się do ostatnich debat na temat statusu uwagi jako mechanizmu wyjaśniającego, eksperymentujemy z dostosowaniem mBERT na nadzorowanym celu parsowania przy jednoczesnym zamrażaniu różnych serii parametrów. Co ciekawe, kierując celem nauki wyraźnej struktury językowej, znajdujemy dużą część tej samej struktury reprezentowanej w wynikających z nich wzorcach uwagi, z ciekawymi różnicami w odniesieniu do których parametrów są zamrożone.', 'mn': 'Трансформацийн нэр хүндлэгчийг NLP-ийн ерөнхий зорилготой шинж тэмдэглэгч болсон учраас олон судалгаанууд хэлний бүтээгдэхүүний шинэ олон толгой анхаарлын механизмаас хэлний бүтээгдэхүүнийг шинэчлэх хичээлд Гэвч ийм олон ажил нь англи хэл дээр л анхаарлаа анхаарлаа төвлөрсөн. Энэ хэл нь хатуу үг дарааллаар, нөлөөлдөг морфологи байхгүй. Энэ судалгаанд бид 18 хэл дээр олон хэлний BERT-ын хувьд хамааралтай синтаксис анхаарлын хэлбэрээр дүрслэгдсэн утгыг шинжлэх ухааны тулд олон хэлний туршилтыг үзүүлнэ. Бид бүрэн мод нь нэг анхаарлын толгойд тодорхойлогдож чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна. Хүн бүрийн харилцаа ихэвчлэн хэл дээр ижил толгойд дамжуулдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Түүнчлэн, саяхан анхаарлын статусыг тайлбарлах механизм гэж ярилцах зорилго дээр бид мBERT-г удирдлагатай ажиллах зорилго дээр шалгаж, өөр хэдэн параметр мөсөж байна. Хамгийн сонирхолтой нь, хэл хэлний бүтэц сурах зорилго руу удирдах тусам бид ижил бүтэц нөлөөлж буй анхаарал төлөвлөгөөний хэлбэрээр дүрслэгдсэн байдаг. Ямар параметр мөчлөгдсөн талаар сонирхолтой ялгаатай.', 'sr': 'Pošto je popularizacija transformera kao koder općeg cilja za NLP, mnogi studiji su pokušali da dekodiraju lingvističku strukturu iz svog romanskog mehanizma multiglavne pažnje. Međutim, većina takvog rada je skoro ekskluzivno fokusirana na engleski jezik sa krutim redom riječi i nedostatak inflekcionalne morfologije. U ovoj studiji predstavljamo eksperimente za dekodiranje multijezičkog BERT-a na 18 jezika kako bi testirali generalizabilnost tvrdnje da je syntaksa zavisnosti odražena u obrascima pažnje. Pokazujemo da puna drveća može biti dekodirana iznad početne tačnosti od jednog glave pažnje i da se pojedinačni odnosi često prate istim glavama na jezicima. Osim toga, u pokušaju da se obratimo nedavnim debatima o statusu pažnje kao objašnjavajući mehanizam, eksperimentiramo sa finom prilagodbom mBERT na nadziranom cilju analize dok se smrzavamo različite serije parametara. Zanimljivo je da upravljamo ciljem da naučimo eksplicitnu lingvističku strukturu, nađemo mnogo iste strukture predstavljene u rezultatnim obrascima pažnje, sa zanimljivim razlikama u vezi koje su parametre zamrznute.', 'sv': 'Sedan populariseringen av Transformer som en generell funktionskodare för NLP har många studier försökt avkoda språklig struktur från dess nya multi-head uppmärksamhet mekanism. Men mycket av sådant arbete fokuserade nästan uteslutande på engelska - ett språk med stel ordordning och brist på böjningsmorfologi. I denna studie presenterar vi avkodningsexperiment för flerspråkig BERT på 18 språk för att testa generaliseringen av påståendet att beroendesyntax återspeglas i uppmärksamhetsmönster. Vi visar att hela träd kan avkodas över baslinjen noggrannhet från enskilda uppmärksamhetshuvuden, och att enskilda relationer ofta spåras av samma huvuden över språk. Dessutom, i ett försök att ta itu med de senaste debatterna om uppmärksamhetens status som förklarande mekanism, experimenterar vi med finjustering av mBERT på ett övervakat tolkningsmål samtidigt som vi fryser olika serier av parametrar. Intressant nog, när vi styr målet att lära oss explicit språklig struktur, finner vi mycket av samma struktur representerad i de resulterande uppmärksamhetsmönstren, med intressanta skillnader med avseende på vilka parametrar som fryss.', 'so': 'Tan iyo marka lagu populariyey turjubaanka oo ah aqoonsiga guud ee NLP, waxbarasho badan ayaa isku dayay inay ka codsadaan dhismaha luuqadda ee warqada ah ee warqaddiisa farshaxan badan oo madax-focus ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, shaqada badan oo ay tahay mid keliya oo kaliya Ingiriis - luqad ku qoran amar adag iyo baahida dhaqdhaqaaq. Waxbarashadan, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa imtixaanka kooban oo ku qoran 18 luuqadood oo luuqado kala duduwan BERT si aan u imtixaano tusaale ahaan, in cashuurta ku xiran lagu soo bandhigayo. Waxaynu muujinnaa in geedaha buuxa lagu koobi karo saxda aasaasiga ah oo hal madax looga jeedo, xiriirka gaarka ah waxaa inta badan la daba socdaa madax isku mid ah oo luqada kala duduwan. Furthermore, markaan isku dayno debaasho ku saabsan xaaladda dhegaynta sida mid u kala duduwan, waxaynu imtixaamaynaa mBERT si fiican u sameynaya goal la ilaaliyey baaritaanka marka a an qabowno parameters kala duduwan. Si xiiso leh, si aad ugu hogaansamayso in la barto dhismaha luuqada oo cad, waxaynu helaynaa dhismo badan oo isku mid ah oo ka mid ah qaababka dareecada, iyo kala duwanaanshaha xiiso oo ku saabsan heerarka ay baran yihiin.', 'ta': 'மாற்றுதலின் பொது தலைப்பு குறியீட்டு குறியீட்டின் பொதுவான குறியீட்டாக்கத்தின் பொதுவாக்கம் இருந்து, பல ஆய்வுகள் அதன் புதைய பல தலைப்பு கவ ஆனால், இது பெரும்பாலான வேலையில் மட்டுமே ஆங்கிலத்தில் கவனம் செலுத்தப்பட்டது - சரியான வார்த்தை வரிசையுடன் மொழி மற்று இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், நாம் 18 மொழிகளுக்கு பல மொழிக்கு BERT குறியீட்டு சோதனைகளை காண்பிக்கிறோம். சார்ந்த சார்பு ஒத்திசைவு முறைமை நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் முழு மரங்களும் அடிப்படைக்கோட்டின் சரியை மட்டும் குறியீடு செய்ய முடியும் என்பதை காட்டுகிறோ மேலும், சமீபத்தில் கவனத்தின் நிலையைப் பற்றி விவாதம் செய்ய ஒரு விளக்கமான முறைமையாக முயற்சிக்கும் போது, மேலும் கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட பாடல் காட்சி பொருளை  சுவாரஸ்யமானது, வெளிப்படையான மொழி அமைப்பை கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் இலக்குகளை நிலைப்படுத்துவதற்கு, முடிவுகளின் கவனத்தின் முறைகளில் குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட ஒரே அமை', 'si': 'NLP වෙනුවෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය හැකියාවක් සංකේතකයෙක් විදියට පස්සේ, බොහොම අභ්\u200dයාසයෙන් භාෂාවික ස්ථානය විස්තර කරන්න උත්සාහ කලා  නමුත්, ඒ වගේම වැඩේ ගොඩක් වැඩේ ඉංග්\u200dරීසියේ විශේෂයෙන් ඉංග්\u200dරීසියෙන් පිළිගත්තා - භාෂාවක් හරිම මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, අපි බොහොම භාෂාවක් BERT වලින් භාෂාවක් 18 වලින් ඩිකෝඩ් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න, අවශ්\u200d අපි පෙන්වන්නේ පූර්ණ ගස් වලින් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් අධ්\u200dයා ඉතින්, අලුත් වාර්තාවක් ගැන අවධානයේ ස්ථිතිය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න උත්සාහ කරනවා, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන ප්\u200dරශ්ණයෙන්ම, භාෂාවික ස්ථානය ඉගෙන ගන්න අරමුණ විදිහට, අපි හොයාගන්නේ අවස්ථාවක් විදිහට අවස්ථාවක් තියෙන්නේ අවස්ථාවක', 'ur': 'ترنسفورٹ کی جماعت کے بعد NLP کے لئے عمومی موضوع کا کوڈر بنا دیا گیا ہے، بہت سی مطالعہ اس کے روزنامہ مطالعہ سے زبان صنعت کو دھوکا کرنے کی کوشش کی ہے۔ لیکن اس طرح بہت سی کام انگلیسی پر محسوس کیا گیا ہے - ایک زبان جس میں سخت لفظ اورغیر اثرات کی کمزوری ہے۔ اس مطالعہ میں ہم 18 زبانوں میں بہت سی زبان BERT کے لئے ڈیکوڈ کی آزمائش پیش کرتے ہیں تاکہ اس مطالعہ کی عمومی قابلیت امتحان کریں کہ اعتباری سینٹکس توجه کے نمونوں میں تفصیل کی جاتی ہے. ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ تمام درختوں کو بنیادی لین کے بالا ایک سر سے دکھائے جاتے ہیں، اور یہ کہ اہل رابطہ اکثر ایک سر سے زبانوں میں ایک ہی سر کے پیچھے لگاتے ہیں۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، اچھی بحث کے بارے میں اچھی بحث کے بارے میں ایک واضح مکانیسم کے طور پر، ہم ایک نظارت پارسینگ موضوع پر اچھی تدبیر کرنے کی کوشش میں آزمائش کرتے ہیں اور مختلف پارسینٹوں کی سریع freezing کرتے ہیں. علاقمند ہے کہ صریح زبان کی ساختاری کی تعلیم کرنے کے لئے موضوع کی مدد کرنا، ہم ایک ہی ساختار میں سے بہت سی ساختار پاتے ہیں جو نتیجۂ توجه الٹنوں میں نمایش کی گئی ہے، اور کس پارامتروں کے بارے میں علاقمند اختلاف کے ساتھ۔', 'vi': 'Từ khi biến biến thành một bộ mã hóa biến hình thành một bộ mã hóa đặc trưng cho chọc dò tủy sống, nhiều nghiên cứu đã cố giải mã cấu trúc ngôn ngữ từ cỗ máy gây chú ý đa đầu mới của nó. Tuy nhiên, phần lớn công việc này tập trung gần như độc quyền vào tiếng Anh... một ngôn ngữ có trật tự từ cứng nhắc và thiếu độ chuẩn dẫn tới. Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi giới thiệu các thí nghiệm giải mã cho hỗn hợp ALT xuyên suốt 18 ngôn ngữ để kiểm tra tổng thể của yêu cầu cộng hưởng phụ thuộc phản ánh trong các mô hình chú ý. Chúng tôi cho thấy các cây đầy đủ có thể giải mã trên mức cơ bản chính xác từ một đầu tập trung, và các mối quan hệ cá nhân thường được theo dõi bởi cùng một đầu trên các ngôn ngữ. Hơn nữa, trong nỗ lực giải quyết những cuộc tranh luận gần đây về vị trí chú ý như một cơ chế giải thích, chúng tôi thử nghiệm với kết quả nghiên cứu cẩn thận trên một mục tiêu phân tích được giám sát, đồng thời đóng băng các loạt các tham số khác nhau. Thật thú vị, trong việc điều khiển mục tiêu học được cấu trúc ngôn ngữ rõ ràng, chúng tôi tìm thấy nhiều cấu trúc giống nhau đại diện trong các mô hình chú ý kết quả, với những khác biệt thú vị về các thông số bị đóng băng.', 'uz': "Name Lekin, bu ishlarning ko'pchiligi eng'liz tilida faqat eng'iz tiliga qaramadi - to'g'ri so'zlar tartibi va qo'llangan morfologiya yo'q. Bu o'rganida, biz bir necha tilda BERT uchun ko'plab tilda ko'proq tajribalarni ko'rinishimiz mumkin. Shunday qilib, biz qo'llanmalar qo'llanmalarning umumiyatligini tekshirish mumkin. Biz buni ko'rayapmiz, butun daraxtlar bir xil boshqaruvchidan foydalanishi mumkin, va oddiy aloqalar ko'p tillarda bir necha boshqaruvchidan foydalanishi mumkin. Ko'pchilik, yangi qismlarni aniqlash mechanisining holati haqida javob berishga harakat qilib, biz mBERT haqida bir xil parametrlarni ajratishga tayyorlash imkoniyatini tajriba qilamiz. Shunday qiziqarli, bir xil tilni o'rganish uchun bir xil tuzuvni boshqarish uchun, biz kelib chiqqan paytlarning natijasida o'xshash tuzuvlar tartibi bilan ko'proq qiziqarli o'zgarishlar bilan boshlanamiz.", 'hr': 'Pošto je popularizacija transformera kao kodera općeg cilja za NLP, mnogi ispitivanja pokušavali su dekodirati jezičku strukturu iz svog novog mehanizma pažnje multiglavnih glava. Međutim, većina takvog rada usredotočilo se skoro isključivo na engleski - jezik s krutim riječima i nedostatak inflekcionalne morfologije. U ovom ispitivanju predstavljamo eksperimente za dekodiranje multijezičkog BERT-a na 18 jezika kako bi testirali generalizabilnost tvrdnje da se sintaks ovisnosti odražava u obrascima pažnje. Pokazujemo da puna drveća može biti dekodirana iznad početne preciznosti od jednog glave pažnje i da se pojedinačni odnosi često prate istim glavama na jezicima. Osim toga, u pokušaju razgovarati o nedavnim debatima o statusu pažnje kao objašnjavajući mehanizam, eksperimentiramo s finom prilagodbom mBERT-a o nadziranom cilju analize dok smrzavamo različite niz parametara. Zanimljivo je, u upravljanju ciljem da naučimo jasnu jezičku strukturu, naći ćemo mnogo isto strukturu predstavljenu u rezultativnim obrascima pažnje, sa zanimljivim razlikama u vezi kojih su parametra zamrznuti.', 'da': 'Siden populariseringen af Transformeren som en generel funktionskoder til NLP, har mange undersøgelser forsøgt at afkode sproglig struktur fra dens nye multi-head opmærksomhedsmekanisme. Imidlertid fokuserede meget af dette arbejde næsten udelukkende på engelsk - et sprog med stiv ordrækkefølge og en mangel på bøjningsmorfologi. I denne undersøgelse præsenterer vi afkodningseksperimenter for flersproget BERT på tværs af 18 sprog for at teste generaliseringen af påstanden om, at afhængighedssyntaks afspejles i opmærksomhedsmønstre. Vi viser, at fulde træer kan afkodes over baseline nøjagtighed fra enkelte opmærksomhedshoveder, og at individuelle relationer ofte spores af de samme hoveder på tværs af sprog. I et forsøg på at behandle de seneste debatter om opmærksomhedens status som en forklarende mekanisme eksperimenterer vi desuden med finjustering af mBERT på et overvåget parsing mål, samtidig med at vi fryser forskellige rækker af parametre. Interessant nok, når vi styrer målet om at lære eksplicit sproglig struktur, finder vi meget af den samme struktur repræsenteret i de resulterende opmærksomhedsmønstre, med interessante forskelle med hensyn til, hvilke parametre der er fastfrosset.', 'id': 'Sejak popularisasi Transformer sebagai pengkode fitur tujuan umum untuk NLP, banyak studi telah mencoba untuk mendekode struktur bahasa dari mekanisme perhatian multikepalanya yang baru. Namun, banyak pekerjaan seperti itu fokus hampir eksklusif pada bahasa Inggris - bahasa dengan perintah kata yang kasar dan kekurangan morfologi inflektional. Dalam penelitian ini, kami mempersembahkan eksperimen dekoding untuk BERT berbagai bahasa melalui 18 bahasa untuk menguji generalisasi klaim bahwa sintaks dependensi refleksi dalam pola perhatian. Kami menunjukkan bahwa pohon penuh dapat dikodeksi di atas akurasi dasar dari kepala perhatian tunggal, dan bahwa hubungan individu sering dilacak oleh kepala yang sama melalui bahasa. Selain itu, dalam percobaan untuk mengatasi debat baru-baru ini tentang status perhatian sebagai mekanisme penjelasan, kami eksperimen dengan memperbaiki mBERT pada objek penganalisan yang diawasi sementara membeku seri parameter yang berbeda. Menarik, dalam mengarahkan tujuan untuk belajar struktur bahasa eksplicit, kita menemukan banyak struktur yang sama yang mewakili dalam pola perhatian yang berasal, dengan perbedaan yang menarik terhadap parameter yang membeku.', 'bg': 'След популяризирането на трансформатора като кодер с общо предназначение за НЛП, много изследвания се опитват да декодират лингвистичната структура от неговия нов механизъм за многоглаво внимание. Въпреки това, голяма част от тази работа се фокусира почти изключително върху английския език - език с твърд словен ред и липса на флексионна морфология. В това проучване ние представяме експерименти за декодиране на многоезични BERT на 18 езика, за да тестваме обобщаваемостта на твърдението, че синтаксисът на зависимост се отразява в моделите на внимание. Показваме, че пълните дървета могат да бъдат декодирани над базовата точност от единични глави на вниманието и че индивидуалните отношения често се проследяват от едни и същи глави в различните езици. Освен това, в опит да обърнем внимание на последните дебати относно статуса на вниманието като обяснителен механизъм, експериментираме с фина настройка на mBERT върху цел контролирано анализиране, като същевременно замразяваме различни серии от параметри. Интересното е, че при насочването на целта за изучаване на изрична езикова структура откриваме голяма част от същата структура, представена в получените модели на внимание, с интересни разлики по отношение на това кои параметри са замразени.', 'nl': 'Sinds de popularisering van de Transformer als een algemene functie encoder voor NLP, hebben veel studies geprobeerd om linguïstische structuur te decoderen van zijn nieuwe multi-head aandachtsmechanisme. Echter, veel van dit werk concentreerde zich bijna uitsluitend op de Engelse sca-taal met een rigide woordorde en een gebrek aan flexionele morfologie. In deze studie presenteren we decoderingsexperimenten voor meertalige BERT in 18-talen om de generaliseerbaarheid te testen van de bewering dat afhankelijkheidssyntaxis wordt weerspiegeld in aandachtspatronen. We laten zien dat volledige bomen boven baseline nauwkeurigheid kunnen worden gedecodeerd van enkele aandachtskoppen, en dat individuele relaties vaak worden gevolgd door dezelfde hoofden in verschillende talen. In een poging om recente debatten over de status van aandacht als verklarend mechanisme aan te pakken, experimenteren we verder met het finetunen van mBERT op een begeleid parsing doel terwijl verschillende reeksen parameters worden bevroren. Interessant genoeg vinden we bij het sturen van de doelstelling om expliciete taalstructuur te leren veel van dezelfde structuur vertegenwoordigd in de resulterende aandachtspatronen, met interessante verschillen met betrekking tot welke parameters worden bevroren.', 'de': 'Seit der Popularisierung des Transformers als universeller Feature Encoder für NLP haben viele Studien versucht, linguistische Strukturen aus seinem neuartigen Mehrkopf-Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus zu entschlüsseln. Ein Großteil dieser Arbeiten konzentrierte sich jedoch fast ausschließlich auf die englische Schaa-Sprache mit starrer Wortordnung und fehlender Flexionsmorphologie. In dieser Studie präsentieren wir Dekodierungsexperimente für mehrsprachiges BERT über 18-Sprachen hinweg, um die Verallgemeinerbarkeit der Behauptung zu testen, dass Abhängigkeitssyntax sich in Aufmerksamkeitsmustern widerspiegelt. Wir zeigen, dass vollständige Bäume über die Baseline-Genauigkeit von einzelnen Aufmerksamkeitsköpfen decodiert werden können, und dass einzelne Beziehungen oft von denselben Köpfen über Sprachen hinweg verfolgt werden. Darüber hinaus experimentieren wir mit der Feinabstimmung von mBERT an einem überwachten Parsing-Ziel, während verschiedene Parameterreihen eingefroren werden. Interessanterweise finden wir bei der Steuerung des Ziels, explizite linguistische Strukturen zu lernen, einen Großteil der gleichen Struktur in den resultierenden Aufmerksamkeitsmustern, mit interessanten Unterschieden in Bezug auf die eingefrorenen Parameter.', 'ko': 'Transformer가 NLP의 유니버설 특징 인코더로 보급된 이래 많은 연구들이 새로운 다중 주의 메커니즘에서 언어 구조를 디코딩하려고 시도했다.그러나 많은 이런 연구들이 거의 전적으로 영어에 집중되어 있다. 어순이 경직되고 굴절 변화가 없는 언어이다.이 연구에서 우리는 18개 언어의 다중 언어 BERT에 대해 디코딩 실험을 실시하여 의존 문법이 주의 모델에 반영된 이 견해의 보편성을 테스트했다.우리는 온전한 나무는 하나의 주의 헤드에서 기선보다 높은 정확도까지 디코딩할 수 있고 개체 관계는 일반적으로 서로 다른 언어의 같은 주의 헤드로 추적된다는 것을 발견했다.또한 최근 주의 상태가 해석 메커니즘으로서의 논쟁을 해결하기 위해 우리는 감독이 있는 문법 분석 목표에서 mBERT 실험을 미세하게 조정하고 서로 다른 파라미터 시리즈를 동결했다.흥미로운 것은 현식 언어 구조를 학습하는 목표를 지도할 때 우리는 발생하는 주의 모델에서 대부분의 구조가 같고 어떤 파라미터가 동결되는지에 흥미로운 차이가 존재한다는 것을 발견했다.', 'sw': 'Tangu umaarufu wa WaTransfer kama utaratibu wa ujumla wa lengo la NLP, tafiti nyingi zimejaribu kupunguza muundo wa lugha kutoka katika mfumo wake wa kutangaza vifaa vingi. Hata hivyo, kazi nyingi ya aina hiyo ilijikita kwenye lugha ya Kiingereza - lugha yenye utaratibu wa maneno madhubuti na ukosefu wa kisiasa. Katika utafiti huu, tunaonyesha majaribio ya kuboresha kwa lugha mbalimbali ya BERT katika lugha 18 ili kujaribu uhalisia wa madai kwamba kodi ya kutegemea ya kujitegemea inaonyesha katika mitindo ya ufuatiliaji. Tunaonyesha kuwa mti mzima unaweza kupunguzwa ukweli wa msingi kutoka kwenye vichwa vya habari moja, na kwamba mahusiano binafsi mara nyingi hufuatiliwa na vichwa vinavyofanana katika lugha hizo. Zaidi ya hayo, katika jaribio la kuzungumzia mjadala wa hivi karibuni kuhusu hali ya kusikiliza kama mfumo wa kuelezea, tunajaribu kwa mBERT kwa lengo la kutengeneza mabadiliko wakati tunavua mfululizo tofauti wa parameter. Inafurahisha, katika kuongoza lengo la kujifunza muundo wa lugha wazi, tunagundua muundo huo uliofanywa na mitindo ya kusikiliza, na tofauti ya kusisimua kuhusu kipi kipi kipi kipi kipi kipi kipi kipi kilichokuwa kimeonekana.', 'tr': 'Transformerden NLP üçin umumy maksady kodçysy bolan sebäpli köp studiler, bir näçe lingwistiki strukturyny öz multi-kelli üns mekanizmasyndan çykarmak synanyşdylar. Ýöne şol işiň köpüsi diňe iňlisçe diňe üns berdi - söz düzeni ýok bir dil we eňlisçe morfologiýasy ýok. Bu araşdyrmada, biz çoklu diller BERT üçin 18 dillerde ködleme deneyleri çykýarys diýip çarpyşlygyň umumy syntaksiniň üns çekilmegi üçin göz önüne görkezilip barýarys. Biz doly agaçlaryň be ýik kellelerden takyklyklygynyň üstünde süýtgebilir diýip görkezip bilýäris we birnäçe ilişkiler köplenç dillerde bir kelle bilen yzarlanýar. Munuň üçin, soňky debatlaryň üns durumyny düşündirişi meýdançasynda, beýleki parameterler dondurup durýan mBERT-y üstlenen a ýlamak maksadynda synanyşýarys. Gyzykly bolsa, lingwistiki düzgünlerini öwrenmek üçin maksadyň üstüne seredeniňde bir nusga köp görnüşi bolan düzgünlerde, haýsynda parametreler dondurulýan gyzykly üýtgeşmeler bilen taparys.', 'am': 'ከዘጠኝ ጀምሮ ለNLP አዋጅ የሆኑት የፊርቨርስቲ አካባቢ የፊደል አካባቢ ኮድ ሲሆን ብዙ ምርመራዎች የቋንቋዊ ግንኙነትን ከረኀብ ብዙዎች የልዩ አካባቢ ምክረት ማድረግ ሞክረዋል፡፡ However, much of such work focused almost exclusively on English - a language with rigid word order and a lack of inflectional morphology.  በዚህ ትምህርት፣ የደጋፊ ሲንካስር በተመለከተ ምሳሌ ላይ የሚደረገውን የውይይት ግንኙነት ለመፈተን እናደርጋለን፡፡ የሙሉ ዛፎች በአውቀት ደረጃዎች ላይ እርግጠኝነት እንዲቀበል እናሳያቸዋለን፣ የግንኙነት ብዙዎች በአንድ ቋንቋዎች ላይ በአንድ ራስ የተከተሉ ናቸው፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የቀድሞው የጥያቄን አካባቢ መስኮት ለመጠየቅ በተቃውሞ ውይይት ለመፈለግ፣ በተለየ የተለያዩ መስኮቶች ሲቆርጥ mBERT በተመለከተ የፓርቲ አካባቢ በመጠቀም እናደርጋለን፡፡ በአደጋጋጋሚ፣ የቋንቋዊ ቋንቋ ሥርዓት ለመማር አቃውሞ፣ በሚያሳየው የጥያቄ ዓይነቶች በተለየ ብዙዎችን እናገኛለን፡፡', 'af': "Omdat die populariseering van die Transformer as 'n algemene-doel-funksie enkoderer vir NLP, het baie studie probeer om lingwisiese struktuur te dekodeer van sy novele multikop aandag mekanisme. Maar baie van sodanige werk het amper eksklusief op Engels gefokus - 'n taal met rige woord volgorde en 'n ontbreek van infleksionele morfologie. In hierdie studie, voorsien ons dekodering eksperimente vir multilinguele BERT oor 18 tale om die generelliseerde verplig te probeer dat afhanklikheid sintaks in aandagpatrone reflekteer word. Ons wys dat volle bome kan dekodeer word bo baselyn presies van enkele aandagkoppe, en dat individuele verwantings dikwels deur dieselfde koppe oor tale agtervolg word. Ook, in 'n probeer om onlangse debate te spreek oor die status van aandag as 'n uitduidelike mekanisme, ons eksperimenteer met fyn-tuning mBERT op 'n ondersoekte verwerking objekt terwyl ons verskillende reeks van parameters frees. Interesantlik, in die steering van die objekte om eksplisiese lingwisiese struktuur te leer, vind ons baie van die selfde struktuur wat in die resulteerde aandagpatrone verteenwoordig is, met interessante verskille met respek na watter parameters gesny word.", 'sq': 'Since the popularization of the Transformer as a general-purpose feature encoder for NLP, many studies have attempted to decode linguistic structure from its novel multi-head attention mechanism.  Megjithatë, shumica e punës së tillë u përqëndrua pothuajse ekskluzivisht në anglisht - një gjuhë me rend të ashpër fjalësh dhe një mungesë morfologjike të pakëndshme. Në këtë studim, ne paraqesim eksperimente dekodimi për BERT shumëgjuhës nëpër 18 gjuhë me qëllim që të testojmë gjeneralizueshmërinë e pretendimit se sintaksi i varësisë pasqyrohet në modelet e vëmendjes. Ne tregojmë se pemët e plota mund të dekodizohen mbi saktësinë bazë nga kokat e vetme të vëmendjes dhe se marrëdhëniet individuale shpesh ndjekin nga të njëjtat koka nëpër gjuhë. Përveç kësaj, në një përpjekje për të trajtuar debatet e fundit rreth statusit të vëmendjes si një mekanizëm shpjegues, ne eksperimentojmë me rregullimin e mBERT në një objektiv analizimi të mbikqyrur ndërsa ngrijmë seri të ndryshme parametrash. Interesante, në drejtimin e objektivit për të mësuar strukturën gjuhësore eksplicite, gjejmë shumë të njëjtin strukturë të përfaqësuar në modelet e vëmendjes që rezultojnë, me dallime interesante lidhur me parametrat e ngrira.', 'hy': 'Քանի որ Թերֆորմերի բնակչությունը որպես ընդհանուր նպատակի կոդեր ՆԼՊ-ի համար, շատ ուսումնասիրություններ փորձել են բացահայտել լեզվաբանական կառուցվածքը իր նոր բազմագլխավոր ուշադրության մեխանիզմից: Այնուամենայնիվ, նման աշխատանքների մեծ մասը կենտրոնացավ գրեթե միայն անգլերենի վրա, մի լեզու, որն ունի խիստ բառերի կարգ և ազդեցության մորֆոլոգիայի բացակայությունը: Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք ներկայացնում ենք բազմալեզու BER-ի բացակոդացման փորձարկումներ 18 լեզուներում, որպեսզի ստուգենք, թե արդյոք կախվածության սինտաքսը արտահայտվում է ուշադրության կաղապարներում: We show that full trees can be decoded above baseline accuracy from single attention heads, and that individual relations are often tracked by the same heads across languages.  Ավելին, ուշադրության կարգավիճակի մասին վերջին քննարկումների լուծման փորձի համար որպես բացատրական մեխանիզմ, մենք փորձում ենք վերահսկված վերլուծության օբյեկտիվ վերահսկված mBER-ի հետ, սառելով տարբեր պարամետրերի շարքերը: Հետաքրքիր է, որ պարզ լեզվաբանական կառուցվածք սովորելու նպատակի ուղղությամբ մենք գտնում ենք նույն կառուցվածքը, որը ներկայացված է հետևյալ ուշադրության կաղապարներում, հետաքրքիր տարբերություններով այն հարցում, թե որոնք պարամետրերը սառցած են', 'az': "Transformer'in nümunəlik məqsədilə NLP kodlayıcısı olaraq popularizasyondan sonra, çoxlu təcrübələr roman çoxlu başlıq məqsədilindən dil strukturasını dekodinə çəkməyə çalışırlar. Ancaq böyük işlərin çoxu İngilizce dilinə tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərə Bu təcrübədə, çoxlu dil BERT üçün çoxlu təcrübələrini 18 dillərdə göstərdik ki, bağımlılıq sintaksinin paylaşılması şəklində təcrübə ediləcəyini təsdiqləmək üçün çoxlu dildə təcrübə edirik. Biz bütün ağaclar tək tərəfdən tək tərəfdən tək tərəflərin doğruluğunun üstündə kodlanabilirik və tək tərəflərin dillərin arasında eyni başların tərəflərinə tabe edilməsini göstəririk. Daha sonra, yeni mübahisə etmək üçün gözləmə durumunu aydınlaşdırma mehanizmi olaraq, müxtəlif parametrlərin seriyasını dondurmaq üçün müəyyən edilmiş fərqləmə məqsədilə mBERT'i gözləyir. İlginç ki, açıq dil quruluğunu öyrənmək məqsədini dəstəkləndirmək üçün, bəzi quruluğun nəticə etdiyi növbənöv növbənöv növbənöv növbənöv növbənöv növbənöv növbənöv növbənöv növbənöv növbə", 'fa': 'از زمانی که تبدیل کردن تبدیل کننده به عنوان ویژه\u200cهای متخصص عمومی برای NLP، تعدادی از مطالعه\u200cهای زیادی سعی کردند ساختار زبان\u200cشناسی را از مکانیسم توجه چندین سرش دکود کند. ولی بسیاری از این کارها تقریباً به خاص انگلیسی تمرکز شده است - یک زبان با سفارش کلمه استوار و ناتوانی مورفولوژی اثبات است. در این مطالعه، ما آزمایش\u200cهای دیدکوندی برای BERT multilingual را در ۱۸ زبان نشان می\u200cدهیم تا آزمایش قابلیت عمومی از ادعا که syntax بستگی در الگوهای توجه تفکیر می\u200cشود. ما نشان می دهیم که درختان کامل می توانند بالای دقیقات خط پایین از سرهای یک توجه دکوع شوند، و که رابطه\u200cهای فردی اغلب با سرهای یکسان در زبان تعقیب می\u200cشوند. علاوه بر این، در سعی که بحث های اخیر در مورد وضعیت توجه به عنوان یک مکانیسم توضیح بحث کنیم، ما آزمایش می کنیم با توجه کردن mBERT به یک هدف تولید نظارت شده در حالی که سری پارامترها متفاوت است. Interestingly, in steering the objective to learn explicit linguistic structure, we find much of the same structure represented in the resulting attention patterns, with interesting differences with which parameters are frozen.', 'cs': 'Od popularizace transformátoru jako univerzálního snímače vlastností pro NLP se mnoho studií pokusilo dekódovat jazykovou strukturu z jeho nového mechanismu vícehlavové pozornosti. Velká část takové práce se však zaměřila téměř výlučně na anglický jazyk sca s pevným slovním řádem a nedostatkem flexiální morfologie. V této práci představujeme dekódovací experimenty pro vícejazyčné BERT napříč 18-jazyky s cílem otestovat zobecněnost tvrzení, že syntaxe závislosti se odráží ve vzorcích pozornosti. Ukazujeme, že celé stromy mohou být dekódovány nad přesností základního principu z jednotlivých hlav pozornosti a že jednotlivé vztahy jsou často sledovány stejnými hlavami napříč jazyky. Kromě toho, ve snaze řešit nedávné debaty o stavu pozornosti jako vysvětlujícího mechanismu, experimentujeme s jemným laděním mBERT na monitorovaném parsovacím cíli při zamrznutí různých řad parametrů. Zajímavé je, že při řízení cíle naučit se explicitní jazykovou strukturu zjišťujeme, že velká část stejné struktury je reprezentována ve výsledných vzorcích pozornosti, se zajímavými rozdíly, pokud jde o zmrazení parametrů.', 'bn': 'এনএলপির জন্য ট্রান্সফ্রান্সফারের জনপ্রিয় কোডার হিসেবে জনপ্রিয় করার পর থেকে অনেক গবেষণা তার উপন্যাসের মাধ্যমে বহুমাধ্যমের মনোযোগ প্রদান কর However, much of such work focused almost exclusively on English - a language with rigid word order and a lack of inflectional morphology.  এই গবেষণায় আমরা ১৮ ভাষায় বহুভাষার বিবেরেটের জন্য কোডিং পরীক্ষার উপস্থাপন করছি যাতে দাবি করা যে নির্ভরশীল সিন্যাক্সের প্রতি মনোযোগিতা প আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে পুরো গাছগুলো বেসেলাইনের মাধ্যমে সঠিকভাবে কমিয়ে দেওয়া যাবে, আর ব্যক্তিগত সম্পর্ক প্রায়শই একই ভাষায় একই মাথ এছাড়াও, সাম্প্রতিক বিতর্কে একটি ব্যাখ্যাত মেনিস হিসেবে মনোযোগ প্রদানের অবস্থা নিয়ে বিতর্কের প্রচেষ্টা করার চেষ্টায়, আমরা বিভিন্ন ধরনের প্যারামিটার মজার ব্যাপারে আমরা একই কাঠামো প্রতিনিধিত্ব করেছি যার ফলে মনোযোগ প্রতিনিধিত্ব করা হয়েছে, কোন পারামিটার ভাষায় মজার পার্থক্যের মাধ্যমে।', 'bs': 'Pošto je popularizacija transformera kao kodera općeg cilja za NLP, mnogi studiji pokušali su dekodirati jezičku strukturu iz svog romannog mehanizma multiglavne pažnje. Međutim, većina takvog rada usredotočilo se skoro isključivo na engleski - jezik sa krutim redom riječi i nedostatak inflekcionalne morfologije. U ovom ispitivanju predstavljamo eksperimente za dekodiranje multijezičkog BERT-a na 18 jezika kako bi testirali generalizabilnost tvrdnje da se sintaks ovisnosti odražava u obrascima pažnje. Pokazujemo da puna drveća mogu biti dekodirana iznad početne tačnosti od jednog glave pažnje, i da se pojedinačni odnosi često prate istim glavama na jezicima. Osim toga, u pokušaju da se obratimo nedavnim debatima o statusu pažnje kao objašnjavajući mehanizam, eksperimentiramo sa finom prilagodbom mBERT na nadziranom cilju analize dok se smrzavamo različite serije parametara. Zanimljivo je da upravljamo ciljem da naučimo eksplicitnu lingvističku strukturu, nađemo mnogo iste strukture predstavljene u rezultativnim obrascima pažnje, sa zanimljivim razlikama u vezi kojih su parametra zamrznuti.', 'et': 'Alates Transformeri populariseerimisest NLP-i üldise otstarbega kodeerijana on paljud uuringud püüdnud dekodeerida keelelist struktuuri uudsest mitmepealisest tähelepanumehhanismist. Siiski keskendus suur osa sellisest tööst peaaegu eranditult inglise keelele - keelele jäiga sõnajärjekorraga ja paindliku morfoloogia puudumisega. Käesolevas uuringus tutvustame mitmekeelse BERT dekodeerimise eksperimente 18 keeles, et testida väite üldistatavust, et sõltuvussüntaks peegeldub tähelepanu mustrites. Me näitame, et täispuid saab dekodeerida üle algväärtuse üksikutest tähelepanu peadest ja et üksikuid suhteid jälgivad sageli samad pead eri keeltes. Püüdes käsitleda hiljutisi arutelusid tähelepanu kui seletusmehhanismi staatuse üle, katsetame mBERTi peenhäälestamist järelevalve all parsimise eesmärgil, külmutades samal ajal erinevaid parameetreid. Huvitav on, et selgesõnalise keelestruktuuri õppimise eesmärgi juhtimisel leiame palju samast struktuurist, mida esindavad tulemuslikud tähelepanumustrid, huvitavad erinevused selle suhtes, millised parameetrid on külmutatud.', 'ca': "Des que la popularització del Transformer com a codificador de característiques de propòsit general per a NLP, molts estudis han intentat decodificar l'estructura lingüística del seu nou mecanisme d'atenció multicap. Tanmateix, gran part d'aquesta feina es centrava gairebé exclusivament en l'anglès - una llengua amb orden rígid de paraules i falta de morfologia inflexional. In this study, we present decoding experiments for multilingual BERT across 18 languages in order to test the generalizability of the claim that dependency syntax is reflected in attention patterns.  Mostrem que els arbres complets poden ser descodificats per sobre de la precisió basal dels caps d'atenció únics, i que les relacions individuals sovint estan seguides pels mateixos caps a través de llengües. A més, en un intent d'abordar debats recents sobre l'estatus de l'atenció com un mecanisme explicativ, experimentem amb ajustar mBERT en un objectiu d'analització supervisada mentre congelem diverses sèries de paràmetres. Interestingly, in steering the objective to learn explicit linguistic structure, we find much of the same structure represented in the resulting attention patterns, with interesting differences with respect to which parameters are frozen.", 'fi': 'Sen jälkeen kun muuntaja on yleistynyt NLP:n yleiskäyttöiseksi ominaisuuskoodaajaksi, monet tutkimukset ovat yrittäneet purkaa kielellistä rakennetta sen uudesta monipäisestä huomiomekanismista. Kuitenkin suuri osa tällaisesta työstä keskittyi lähes yksinomaan englantiin - kieleen, jolla on jäykkä sanajärjestys ja puutteellinen taipumus morfologia. Tässä tutkimuksessa esitellään monikielisen BERT:n dekoodauskokeita 18 kielellä testataksemme sen väitteen yleistettävyyttä, jonka mukaan riippuvuussuyntaksi heijastuu huomiomalleihin. Osoitamme, että täydelliset puut voidaan dekoodata perusaikataulun tarkkuuden yläpuolella yksittäisistä huomiopäistä ja että samat päät seuraavat usein yksittäisiä suhteita eri kielillä. Lisäksi yritämme käsitellä viimeaikaisia keskusteluja huomion asemasta selittävänä mekanismina, kokeilemme mBERT:n hienosäätöä valvotulla jäsennystavoitteella jäädyttäen samalla eri parametrisarjoja. Kiinnostavaa on, että pyrittäessä oppimaan eksplisiittinen kielellinen rakenne, löydämme paljon samasta rakenteesta, joka on edustettuna tuloksena syntyvissä huomiokuvioissa, mielenkiintoisilla eroilla sen suhteen, mitkä parametrit ovat jäädytetty.', 'jv': 'Dino popularing of the Transformer as a General-goal character koder for NLP, a number of tutoriales have tented to decode language architecture from her multi-head awake mehanisatus. Nanging, akeh lan saiki nggambar obah-obahan luwih dumateng Inggris - kaya langkung awak dhuwis layang lan ora tau ngerasai nyong. Nang ujaran iki, awak dhéwé éntukno akeh operasi nggawe gerangkat kanggo saben ingkang BERT karo 18 luwih kanggo ujian kanggo ngerasakno kapan ginarangke sampek kapan ginarangke sampek kapan ginarangke sampek. Awak dhéwé éntuk punika andhéwé éntuk iki dadi angat luwih jarang winih, lan akeh barang sing saben basa sing dikondisih akeh langgar sampek. text-tool-action Awak dhéwé, nglanggar nggalaksi kanggo ngerasakno dumadhi ingkang luwih dumadhi, awak dhéwé ngerasakno ngono nggawe barang sampeyan ingkang diputara awak dhéwé, karo hal-alam sing paling nggawe gerakan.', 'he': 'מאז הפופולריזציה של הטרנספורטר כקודד תכונות למטרה כללית של NLP, הרבה מחקרים ניסו לפענח מבנה שפתי ממנגנון תשומת לב רב ראשי הרומני שלו. עם זאת, רוב העבודה כזו התמקדה כמעט בלעדית באנגלית - שפה עם סדר מילים קשה וחסר מורפולוגיה מושפעת. במחקר הזה, אנו מציגים ניסויים לפיתוח של BERT רבות שפות במהלך 18 שפות כדי לבדוק את הגנרליזציה של הטענה אנו מראים שעצים מלאים יכולים לפענח מעל מדויקת הבסיס מראשי תשומת לב יחיד, ושמערכות יחסים בודדות לעתים קרובות מתעקבות על ידי אותם ראשים דרך שפות. חוץ מזה, בניסיון להתייחס לדיונים האחרונים על המצב של תשומת לב כמנגנון הסביר, אנו מנסים עם mBERT מתאים על מטרה מבוקרת בדיקה בזמן הקפיאה סדרה שונה של פרמטרים. מעניין, בהנחה במטרה ללמוד מבנה שפתי ברור, אנו מוצאים הרבה מאותו מבנה מייצג בתבניות תשומת לב הנוצאות, עם הבדלים מעניינים בנוגע לאיזה פרמטרים קפואים.', 'sk': 'Od popularizacije transformatorja kot splošnega kodirja značilnosti za NLP so številne študije poskušale dekodirati jezikovno strukturo iz njegovega novega večglavnega mehanizma pozornosti. Vendar se je veliko takšnega dela osredotočalo skoraj izključno na angleščino - jezik s togim besednim redom in pomanjkanjem inflekcijske morfologije. V tej študiji smo predstavili eksperimente dekodiranja večjezičnega BERT v 18 jezikih, da bi preizkusili splošnost trditve, da se sintaksa odvisnosti odraža v vzorcih pozornosti. Pokazali smo, da je polna drevesa mogoče dekodirati nad osnovno natančnostjo iz posameznih glav pozornosti in da posamezne relacije pogosto sledijo iste glave v vseh jezikih. Poleg tega, v poskusu obravnavanja nedavnih razprav o statusu pozornosti kot obrazložitvenega mehanizma, eksperimentiramo z natančnim nastavitvijo mBERT na nadzorovanem cilju razčlenjanja ob zamrznitvi različnih nizov parametrov. Zanimivo je, da pri usmerjanju cilja učenja eksplicitne jezikovne strukture najdemo veliko iste strukture, ki je predstavljena v nastalih vzorcih pozornosti, z zanimivimi razlikami glede tega, kateri parametri so zamrznjeni.', 'ha': "Tan da the popularization of the Transformer as a General-aim feature code for NLP, many research have sought to kode tsarin linguistic from its noveln multi-header surori. Hata da haka, masu yawa daga wannan aikin yana fanati a kan Ingiriya kawai - wata harshe na da tsarin magana mai inganci da kuma bã da wani matsayi mai mutane. Daga wannan lõkaci, Munã gabatar da jarrabo masu ƙaranci wa BERT cikin wasu harshe na'ura 18 dõmin a jarraba gabanin da ke faɗa cẽwa an yi ƙaranci da ɗabi'a, a cikin misãlai masu bincike. Tuna nũna cewa za'a kodi itãce cikakku a kan kode tsari daga nauyi na ƙarƙashin, kuma an gane danganta masu da taraki ko da yawa a kan huɗu masu cikin lugha. Furan haka, cikin jarrabi da za ka yi magana a cikin jãyayya a yanzu masu husũma ga muhalli wa muhimmin muhimmanci kamar wani mai fassarawa, za'a jarraba mBERT a kan an tsare mBERT a kan abun parse da kuma za'a kulle wasu takardar parameters. Ina amfani da shi, dõmin a kiyaye goan ya sanar da wani tsari na lingui mai bayyani, za mu sãmu ko yawa daga ruwan da ke ƙayyade cikin misãlai masu ƙaranci, da sãɓãni mai kwaɗayi a cikin masu da za'a sarrafa parameteri.", 'bo': 'Since the popularization of the Transformer as a general-purpose feature encoder for NLP, many studies have attempted to decode linguistic structure from its novel multi-head attention mechanism. ཡིན་ནའང་། འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་གྲངས་ཀ་གཅིག་ཡང་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གཟུགས་འགྲོ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན། ལྟ་བ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་BERT (སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལྡན་འགྱུར་བའི) སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་སྔོན་ཕྲག་སྟོན་པའི་བརྟག་བཤད་ཆེན་པ་ལ ང་ཚོས་དབྱིབས་ཡོད་པའི་རྩིས་བ་དེ་ལ་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་ངོས་འཛིན་དགོས་པ་ལས་ངོས་འཛིན་ཐུབ་པ་དང་། འབྲེལ་བ་སོ་སོ་སོ་སོ་སོའི་མག Furthermore, in an attempt to address recent debates about the status of attention as an explanatory mechanism, we experiment with fine-tuning mBERT on a supervised parsing objective while freezing different series of parameters. Interestingly, in steering the objective to learn explicit linguistic structure, we find much of the same structure represented in the resulting attention patterns, with interesting differences with respect to which parameters are frozen.'}
{'en': 'CDA : a Cost Efficient Content-based Multilingual Web Document Aligner', 'ar': 'CDA: أداة محاذاة مستندات ويب متعددة اللغات تعتمد على المحتوى وفعالة من حيث التكلفة', 'fr': 'CDA\xa0: un aligneur de documents Web multilingues basé sur le contenu rentable', 'es': 'CDA: un alineador de documentos web multilingüe basado en contenido rentable', 'pt': 'CDA: um Alinhador de Documentos Web Multilíngue Baseado em Conteúdo Econômico', 'hi': 'CDA: एक लागत कुशल सामग्री-आधारित बहुभाषी वेब दस्तावेज़ संरेखक', 'ja': 'CDA ：コスト効率の高いコンテンツベースの多言語Webドキュメントアライナー', 'zh': 'CDA曰:高效多言 Web 文档齐器', 'ru': 'CDA: экономически эффективный контентный многоязычный выравниватель веб-документов', 'ga': 'CDA: Ailíniú Doiciméid Ghréasáin Ilteangacha Bhunaithe ar Chostas', 'ka': 'CDA: მრავალენგური ვებ დოკუმენტის ალიგნიგერიName', 'el': 'Μια οικονομικά αποδοτική πολυγλωσσική ευθυγράμμιση εγγράφων ιστού βασισμένη στο περιεχόμενο', 'hu': 'CDA: egy költséghatékony tartalom-alapú többnyelvű webes dokumentumigazító', 'it': 'CDA: un allineamento di documenti web multilingue basato sui contenuti efficiente in termini di costi', 'lt': 'CDA: sąnaudų efektyvus turinio daugiakalbis interneto dokumentų suderinimas', 'mk': 'Name', 'kk': 'CDA: Мазмұның негіздеген көп тілді веб құжатты түзетушіName', 'ms': 'CDA: Pengalih Dokumen Web Berbahasa Berberasaskan Kandungan Efisien Biaya', 'ml': 'സിഡിഇ: ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന ഉള്ളടക്കത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള പല ഭാഷ വെബ് രേഖയിലുള്ള രേഖ', 'mt': 'CDA: Allinjatur Multilingwi tad-Dokumenti tal-Web ibbażat fuq Kontenut Effiċjenti fl-Ispejjeż', 'mn': 'CDA: үнэ цэнэтэй Content-based Multilingual Web Document Aligner', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'CDA: opłacalny kosztowo oparty na treściach wielojęzyczny Web Document Aligner', 'ro': 'CDA: un aliniator de documente web multilingv bazat pe conținut eficient din punct de vedere al costurilor', 'sr': 'CDA: Aligner multijezičkih web dokumenta na temelju sadržaja koštanja', 'so': 'paper size', 'sv': 'CDA: en kostnadseffektiv innehållsbaserad flerspråkig webbaserad dokumentjustering', 'ta': 'CDA: விலையில் பயன்படும் உள்ளடக்கத்தை அடிப்படையில் உள்ள பல மொழி இணைய ஆவணம் ஒப்பிடுபவர்', 'ur': 'CDA: ایک کاسٹ اثرات منزل پر متعدی زبان ویب ڈوکیم الیگنر', 'si': 'CDA: ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් වෙබ් ලේඛනය සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාව', 'vi': 'Máy nhắc cá nhân có giá trị', 'uz': 'Comment', 'bg': 'CDA: рентабилен многоезичен уеб документ, базиран на съдържание', 'hr': 'CDA: uključivač multijezičkih web dokumenta na temelju sadržaja koštanja', 'da': 'CDA: en omkostningseffektiv indholdsbaseret flersproget webdokumentjustering', 'nl': 'CDA: een kostenefficiënte content-gebaseerde meertalige webdocumentaligner', 'de': 'CDA: ein kosteneffizienter Content-basierter mehrsprachiger Web Document Aligner', 'id': 'CDA: Pengaliran Dokumen Web Berbahasa Berdasarkan Objek Efisien Biaya', 'ko': 'CDA: 컨텐츠 기반의 비용 효율적인 다국어 웹 문서 정렬기', 'fa': 'CDA: تنظیم سند وب چندین زبان', 'sw': 'CDA: a Cost Efficient Content-based Multilingual Web Document Aligner', 'tr': 'CDA: Bir buýruk etkin Mazmunlar tabanly Çot Dilli Web Senedi Täzeldiricisi', 'sq': 'CDA: a Cost Efficient Content-based Multilingual Web Document Aligner', 'am': 'CDA: Cost Effective Content-based Multilingual Web Documenter Aligner', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'CDA: Bütün dillərə bağlı Cənnət Dəstəliyi İzləşdiricisi', 'af': "Cd:  ' n Koste Effektiewe Inhoud- gebaseerde Multilingual Web Dokument Aligner", 'bn': 'সিডিএ: বিষয়বস্তু ভিত্তিক বহুভাষী ওয়েব ডকুমেন্ট অ্যালিজার', 'cs': 'CDA: nákladově efektivní obsahový vícejazyčný webový zarovnávač dokumentů založený na obsahu', 'et': 'CDA: kulutõhus sisupõhine mitmekeelne veebidokumentide joondaja', 'bs': 'CDA: Aligner multijezičkih web dokumenta na temelju sadržaja koštanja', 'ca': 'CDA: Un allinjador multilingüe de documents web basat en continguts cost-efficient', 'fi': 'CDA: kustannustehokas sisältöpohjainen monikielinen Web Document Aligner', 'he': 'Name', 'ha': 'CDA: An Cost Effective Content- based Web Document Aiki', 'sk': 'CDA: stroškovno učinkovit večjezični spletni poravnalnik dokumentov, ki temelji na vsebini', 'bo': 'CDA：སྐད་རིགས་སྤྲོད་ནུས་ཡོད་པའི་ནང་དོན་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་སྤྱོད་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡིག་ཆ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཆས', 'jv': 'CSA: a kost Efeffent Content-basa Multilanguage web document Align'}
{'en': 'We introduce a Content-based Document Alignment approach (CDA), an efficient method to align multilingual web documents based on content in creating parallel training data for machine translation (MT) systems operating at the industrial level. CDA works in two steps : (i) projecting documents of a web domain to a shared multilingual space ; then (ii) aligning them based on the similarity of their representations in such space. We leverage lexical translation models to build vector representations using TFIDF. CDA achieves performance comparable with state-of-the-art systems in the WMT-16 Bilingual Document Alignment Shared Task benchmark while operating in multilingual space. Besides, we created two web-scale datasets to examine the robustness of CDA in an industrial setting involving up to 28 languages and millions of documents. The experiments show that CDA is robust, cost-effective, and is significantly superior in (i) processing large and noisy web data and (ii) scaling to new and low-resourced languages.', 'ar': 'نقدم نهج محاذاة المستندات المستند إلى المحتوى (CDA) ، وهي طريقة فعالة لمحاذاة مستندات الويب متعددة اللغات بناءً على المحتوى في إنشاء بيانات تدريب موازية لأنظمة الترجمة الآلية (MT) التي تعمل على المستوى الصناعي. يعمل CDA في خطوتين: (1) عرض مستندات مجال الويب على مساحة مشتركة متعددة اللغات ؛ ثم (2) مواءمتها بناءً على تشابه تمثيلاتها في هذا الفضاء. نحن نستفيد من نماذج الترجمة المعجمية لبناء تمثيلات متجهية باستخدام TFIDF. تحقق CDA أداءً مشابهًا لأحدث الأنظمة في معيار WMT-16 للمهام المشتركة لمحاذاة المستندات ثنائية اللغة أثناء العمل في مساحة متعددة اللغات. إلى جانب ذلك ، أنشأنا مجموعتي بيانات على نطاق الويب لفحص قوة CDA في بيئة صناعية تتضمن ما يصل إلى 28 لغة وملايين المستندات. تُظهر التجارب أن CDA قوية وفعالة من حيث التكلفة وتتفوق بشكل كبير في (1) معالجة بيانات الويب الكبيرة والصاخبة و (2) التحجيم إلى لغات جديدة ومنخفضة الموارد.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma abordagem de Alinhamento de Documentos Baseado em Conteúdo (CDA), um método eficiente para alinhar documentos da Web multilíngues com base em conteúdo na criação de dados de treinamento paralelos para sistemas de tradução automática (MT) operando em nível industrial. A CDA funciona em duas etapas: (i) projetar documentos de um domínio web para um espaço multilíngue compartilhado; em seguida (ii) alinhá-los com base na similaridade de suas representações nesse espaço. Aproveitamos os modelos de tradução lexical para construir representações vetoriais usando TFIDF. CDA alcança desempenho comparável com sistemas de última geração no benchmark WMT-16 Bilingual Document Alignment Shared Task enquanto opera em espaço multilíngue. Além disso, criamos dois conjuntos de dados em escala da Web para examinar a robustez do CDA em um ambiente industrial envolvendo até 28 idiomas e milhões de documentos. Os experimentos mostram que o CDA é robusto, econômico e significativamente superior em (i) processamento de dados da Web grandes e barulhentos e (ii) dimensionamento para linguagens novas e com poucos recursos.', 'fr': "Nous introduisons une approche d'alignement de documents basée sur le contenu (CDA), une méthode efficace pour aligner des documents Web multilingues en fonction du contenu en créant des données de formation parallèles pour les systèmes de traduction automatique (TA) fonctionnant au niveau industriel. Le CDA fonctionne en deux étapes\xa0: (i) projeter les documents d'un domaine Web dans un espace multilingue partagé\xa0; puis (ii) les aligner en fonction de la similitude de leurs représentations dans cet espace. Nous utilisons des modèles de traduction lexicale pour créer des représentations vectorielles à l'aide de TFIDF. CDA atteint des performances comparables à celles des systèmes de pointe du test WMT-16 Bilingual Document Alignment Shared Task, tout en fonctionnant dans un espace multilingue. En outre, nous avons créé deux ensembles de données à l'échelle du Web pour examiner la robustesse du CDA dans un environnement industriel impliquant jusqu'à 28 langues et des millions de documents. Les expériences montrent que le CDA est robuste, rentable et nettement supérieur dans (i) le traitement de données Web volumineuses et bruyantes et (ii) la mise à l'échelle vers de nouveaux langages à faibles ressources.", 'es': 'Presentamos un enfoque de alineación de documentos (CDA) basado en el contenido, un método eficiente para alinear documentos web multilingües basados en el contenido al crear datos de capacitación paralelos para sistemas de traducción automática (MT) que funcionan a nivel industrial. CDA trabaja en dos pasos: (i) proyectar documentos de un dominio web en un espacio multilingüe compartido; luego (ii) alinearlos en función de la similitud de sus representaciones en dicho espacio. Aprovechamos los modelos de traducción léxica para crear representaciones vectoriales mediante TFIDF. CDA logra un rendimiento comparable al de los sistemas de última generación en el punto de referencia de tareas compartidas de alineación de documentos bilingües WMT-16 mientras opera en un espacio multilingüe. Además, creamos dos conjuntos de datos a escala web para examinar la solidez de la CDA en un entorno industrial que involucra hasta 28 idiomas y millones de documentos. Los experimentos muestran que el CDA es sólido, rentable y significativamente superior en (i) el procesamiento de datos web grandes y ruidosos y (ii) el escalamiento a lenguajes nuevos y de bajos recursos.', 'ja': '産業レベルで動作する機械翻訳（ MT ）システムの並列トレーニングデータを作成する際に、コンテンツに基づいて多言語ウェブドキュメントを整列させる効率的な方法である、コンテンツベースドキュメントアラインメント（ CDA ）アプローチを導入しました。 CDAは、(i) Webドメインのドキュメントを共有された多言語スペースに投影し、(ii)そのようなスペースでの表現の類似性に基づいてそれらを整列させるという2つのステップで機能します。 TFIDFを使用してベクトル表現を構築するために、語彙翻訳モデルを活用しています。 CDAは、多言語スペースで動作しながら、WMT -16バイリンガルドキュメントアライメント共有タスクベンチマークの最先端システムと同等のパフォーマンスを達成します。 さらに、最大28の言語と数百万のドキュメントを含む産業環境でのCDAの堅牢性を調べるために、2つのウェブスケールデータセットを作成しました。 実験は、CDAが堅牢で費用対効果が高く、(i)大規模でノイズの多いウェブデータの処理、および(ii)新しい低資源言語へのスケーリングにおいて著しく優れていることを示しています。', 'zh': '引入文档对齐法 (CDA),此乃齐多言 Web 文档之效,可为工机器翻译 (MT) 并行训练之数。 CDA分为两步驿:(i)将Web域文档投影到多言语空间。 然后(ii)以其空中之相似性齐之。 因词法译模以立 TFIDF 矢量。 CDA 行多言间,得与 WMT-16 双语文档对齐共享,准中最先进之统相当。 又创立二网络规模之数集,以检校CDA多至28种语数百万个文档工鲁棒性。 实验者,CDA之壮也,有成本之益也,而(i)治大、嘈杂之Web数及(ii)之新匮之言有显势也。', 'hi': 'हम एक सामग्री-आधारित दस्तावेज़ संरेखण दृष्टिकोण (CDA) पेश करते हैं, जो औद्योगिक स्तर पर काम करने वाले मशीन अनुवाद (MT) सिस्टम के लिए समानांतर प्रशिक्षण डेटा बनाने में सामग्री के आधार पर बहुभाषी वेब दस्तावेज़ों को संरेखित करने के लिए एक कुशल विधि है। सीडीए दो चरणों में काम करता है: (i) एक साझा बहुभाषी स्थान के लिए एक वेब डोमेन के दस्तावेजों को प्रोजेक्ट करना; फिर (ii) उन्हें इस तरह के स्थान में उनके प्रतिनिधित्व की समानता के आधार पर संरेखित करना। हम TFIDF का उपयोग करके वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व बनाने के लिए लेक्सिकल अनुवाद मॉडल का लाभ उठाते हैं। CDA बहुभाषी स्थान में कार्य करते समय WMT-16 द्विभाषी दस्तावेज़ संरेखण साझा कार्य बेंचमार्क में अत्याधुनिक प्रणालियों के साथ तुलनीय प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है। इसके अलावा, हमने 28 भाषाओं और लाखों दस्तावेजों को शामिल करने वाली औद्योगिक स्थापना में सीडीए की मजबूती की जांच करने के लिए दो वेब-स्केल डेटासेट बनाए। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि सीडीए मजबूत, लागत प्रभावी है, और (i) बड़े और शोर वेब डेटा को संसाधित करने और (ii) नई और कम संसाधन वाली भाषाओं के लिए स्केलिंग में काफी बेहतर है।', 'ru': 'Мы внедряем основанный на контенте подход к выравниванию документов (CDA), эффективный метод выравнивания многоязычных веб-документов на основе контента при создании параллельных обучающих данных для систем машинного перевода (MT), работающих на промышленном уровне. CDA работает в два этапа: (i) проецирование документов веб-домена в общее многоязычное пространство; затем (ii) согласование их на основе сходства их представлений в таком пространстве. Мы используем лексические модели перевода для построения векторных представлений с использованием TFIDF. CDA достигает производительности, сопоставимой с новейшими системами в сравнении с WMT-16 Bilingual Document Alignment Shared Task, работая в многоязычном пространстве. Кроме того, мы создали два набора данных веб-масштаба для изучения надежности CDA в промышленной среде, включающей до 28 языков и миллионы документов. Эксперименты показывают, что CDA является надежным, экономически эффективным и значительно превосходит в (i) обработке больших и шумных веб-данных и (ii) масштабировании на новые и малоресурсные языки.', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach cur chuige um Ailíniú Doiciméad Bunaithe ar Ábhar (CDA), modh éifeachtach chun doiciméid ghréasáin ilteangacha a ailíniú bunaithe ar ábhar chun sonraí oiliúna comhthreomhara a chruthú do chórais aistriúcháin mheaisín (MT) a oibríonn ar an leibhéal tionsclaíoch. Oibríonn CDA in dhá chéim: (i) doiciméid fearainn gréasáin a theilgean chuig spás ilteangach roinnte; ansin (ii) iad a ailíniú bunaithe ar chosúlacht a léiriú sa spás sin. Déanaimid samhlacha aistriúcháin foclóireachta a ghiaráil chun léiriúcháin veicteoirí a thógáil ag baint úsáide as TFIDF. Baineann CDA amach feidhmíocht atá inchomparáide le córais den scoth i dtagarmharc Tasc Comhroinnte um Ailíniú Doiciméad Dátheangach WMT-16 agus é ag feidhmiú i spás ilteangach. Ina theannta sin, chruthaíomar dhá thacar sonraí ar scála Gréasáin chun stóinseacht CDA a scrúdú i suíomh tionsclaíoch a bhfuil suas le 28 teanga agus na milliúin doiciméad ann. Léiríonn na turgnaimh go bhfuil CDA láidir, cost-éifeachtach, agus go bhfuil sé i bhfad níos fearr ó thaobh (i) sonraí gréasáin mór agus torannacha a phróiseáil agus (ii) scálú go teangacha nua agus íseal-acmhainní.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ შევცვალობთ Content-based Document Alignment approach (CDA), მრავალენგური საბოლოო დოკუმენტების შესაბამისად მხოლოდ განზომილების მონაცემების შექმნა პარალელი განზომილების მონაცემების შექმნა მანქანის გარგუნებ Name შემდეგ ii) ისინი გადაწყენება, რომლებიც ისინი გამოსახულებების განსხვავებაში. ჩვენ ლექსიკალური გადაწყვეტილების მოდელების გამოყენებას TFIDF გამოყენებლად გვქტორის გამოყენება. CDA მიიღება მრავალენგური სისტემაში WMT- 16 ბილენგური დოკუმენტის დანაწილება გაყოფილი პარამეტრების ბენქმარი, როდესაც მრავალენგური სისტემაში იმუშაობა. დამატებით, ჩვენ შექმნა ორი ვებ- სკვილის მონაცემები CDA-ს ძალიან ძალიან წარმოდგენებაში, რომელიც 28 წლის და მილიონის დოკუმენტების შესახებ. ექსპერიმენტები ჩვენებს, რომ CDA ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან, ძალიან ძალიან ეფექტიური და უფრო ძალიან უფრო მეტია i) დიდი და ძალიან საბოლო ინტერვის მონაცემებში და ii) ახალი და ცოტა რე', 'hu': 'Bevezetjük a Content-based Document Alignment megközelítést (CDA), amely hatékony módszer a többnyelvű webes dokumentumok tartalom alapján történő igazítására az ipari szinten működő gépi fordítási rendszerek párhuzamos képzési adatainak létrehozására. A CDA két lépésben működik: (i) egy webtartomány dokumentumainak kivetítése egy közös többnyelvű térbe; majd (ii) összehangolják őket az ilyen térben lévő reprezentációk hasonlósága alapján. Lexikális fordítási modelleket használunk a TFIDF segítségével vektorreprezentációk létrehozására. A CDA a WMT-16 kétnyelvű dokumentumaigazítási megosztott feladat referenciaértékének korszerű rendszereivel összehasonlítható teljesítményt ér el, miközben többnyelvű térben működik. Emellett két webes méretű adatkészletet hoztunk létre, hogy megvizsgáljuk a CDA robusztusságát egy ipari környezetben, akár 28 nyelven és több millió dokumentumon belül. A kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a CDA robusztus, költséghatékony, és jelentősen kiválóbb (i) a nagy és zajos webadatok feldolgozásában és (ii) az új és alacsony forrásokkal rendelkező nyelvekre való skálázásban.', 'kk': 'Біз Мазмұны негіздеген құжатты түрлендіру тәсілін (CDA) келтіреміз. Бірнеше тілді веб құжаттарды, индустриалдық деңгейінде операциялық компьютер аудару жүйелерінің параллель оқыту деректерін құру CDA екі қадам бойынша жұмыс істейді: i) веб- доменінің құжаттарын бірнеше тілдік орынға бөліктіру; Name Содан кейін (ii) оларды олардың кеңістіктерінің ұқсастығына негіздеп тұрады. Біз TFIDF арқылы векторды түсіндіру үшін лексикалық аудару үлгілерін құрамыз. CDA WMT- 16 қосымша құжаттың ортақ тапсырмаларды ортақтастыру кезінде ортақ тапсырмаларды бағыттау жүйелерімен салыстыруға мүмкіндік береді. Қосымша, біз 28 тілде және миллион құжаттар бар индустриалдық параметрлерде CDA құндылығын тексеру үшін екі веб- масштабының деректер жиынын құрдық. Тәжірибелер CDA күшті, бағатты эффективті деп көрсетеді, және i) үлкен және дыбыс веб- деректерді өзгерту және ii) жаңа және төменгі ресурстар тілдеріне масштабтау үлкен.', 'lt': 'We introduce a Content-based Document Alignment approach (CDA), an efficient method to align multilingual web documents based on content in creating parallel training data for machine translation (MT) systems operating at the industrial level.  CDA veikia dviem etapais: i) interneto domeno dokumentų projektavimas bendrai daugiakalbei erdvei; ii) juos suderinti atsižvelgiant į jų atstovų panašumą tokioje erdvėje. Mes naudojame lexinius vertimo modelius, kad sukurtume vektorių atstovavimus naudojant TFIDF. CDA pasiekia rezultatus, palyginamus su naujausiomis WMT-16 dvikalbio dokumento suderinimo bendroje užduotyje nustatytomis sistemomis, kai ji veikia daugiakalbėje erdvėje. Be to, sukūrėme du internetinio masto duomenų rinkinius, kad išnagrinėtume CDA patikimumą pramonės aplinkoje, kurioje dalyvavo iki 28 kalbos ir milijonai dokumentų. Eksperimentai rodo, kad CDA yra patikima, ekonomiškai veiksminga ir yra gerokai geresnė i) tvarkant didelius ir triukšmingus tinklo duomenis ir ii) plėtojant juos į naujas ir mažai i šteklių turinčias kalbas.', 'it': "Introducemo un approccio Content-based Document Alignment (CDA), un metodo efficiente per allineare documenti web multilingue basati sui contenuti nella creazione di dati formativi paralleli per sistemi di traduzione automatica (MT) operanti a livello industriale. CDA opera in due fasi: (i) proiettare documenti di un dominio web in uno spazio multilingue condiviso; poi (ii) allineandoli sulla base della somiglianza delle loro rappresentazioni in tale spazio. Utilizziamo modelli di traduzione lessicale per costruire rappresentazioni vettoriali utilizzando TFIDF. CDA raggiunge prestazioni paragonabili ai sistemi all'avanguardia del benchmark WMT-16 Bilingual Document Alignment Shared Task mentre opera in spazio multilingue. Inoltre, abbiamo creato due dataset su scala web per esaminare la robustezza del CDA in un ambiente industriale che coinvolge fino a 28 lingue e milioni di documenti. Gli esperimenti dimostrano che il CDA è robusto, economico ed è significativamente superiore (i) nell'elaborazione di dati web di grandi dimensioni e rumorosi e (ii) nel ridimensionamento a linguaggi nuovi e a basso consumo di risorse.", 'mk': 'Ние воведуваме пристап на содржина-базиран Документ Alignment (CDA), ефикасен метод за алинирање на мултијазичните веб-документи базирани на содржина во создавањето паралелни податоци за обука за машински превод (MT) системи кои работат на индустриск ЦДА работи во два чекори: (i) проектирање документи од веб домен во заеднички мултијазичен простор; потоа (ii) ги израмнуваат врз основа на сличноста на нивните претставувања во ваков простор. Ние ги користиме лексичките преводни модели за да изградиме векторни претставувања користејќи TFIDF. ЦДА постигнува резултат споредлив со најсовремените системи во референтната оценка за споделување на двојниот документ на WMT-16 додека работи во мултијазичен простор. Besides, we created two web-scale datasets to examine the robustness of CDA in an industrial setting involving up to 28 languages and millions of documents.  Експериментите покажуваат дека ЦДА е силна, економски ефикасна и значително супериорна во (i) обработувањето на големи и бучни веб-податоци и (ii) проширување на нови и ниски јазици.', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan pendekatan Penjajaran Dokumen berdasarkan Kandungan (CDA), kaedah efisien untuk jajarkan dokumen web berbilang bahasa berdasarkan kandungan dalam mencipta data latihan selari untuk sistem terjemahan mesin (MT) yang berfungsi pada tahap industri. CDA berfungsi dalam dua langkah: (i) projek dokumen domain web ke ruang berbilang bahasa berkongsi; Kemudian (ii) menyesuaikan mereka berdasarkan persamaan-persamaan mereka dalam ruang tersebut. Kami menggunakan model terjemahan leksikal untuk membina perwakilan vektor menggunakan TFIDF. CDA mencapai prestasi yang boleh dibandingkan dengan sistem-state-of-the-art dalam Jajarkan Dokumen Bilingual WMT-16 tanda referensi Tugas Berkongsi semasa berfungsi dalam ruang berbilang bahasa. Selain itu, kami mencipta dua set data skala web untuk memeriksa kepekatan CDA dalam seting industri yang melibatkan sehingga 28 bahasa dan jutaan dokumen. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa CDA adalah kuat, berkesan pada biaya, dan lebih baik dalam (i) memproses data web yang besar dan bunyi dan (ii) skala kepada bahasa baru dan bahasa yang mempunyai sumber rendah.', 'ml': 'മെഷിന്\u200d പരാലിക്കല്\u200d പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനായി മെഷിന്\u200d പരിശീലന വ്യവസ്ഥകള്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനായി പല ഭാഷയിലുള്ള വെബ് രേഖകള്\u200dക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഒരു ര സിഡിഎ രണ്ടു പടികളില്\u200d ജോലി ചെയ്യുന്നു: (i) വെബ്ല് ഡൊമെയിനിലെ രേഖകള്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dത്ത പല ഭാഷ സ്ഥലത്തേക്ക് പ് എന്നിട്ട് അവരുടെ പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ തുല്യത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലാണ് അവരെ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നത്. ടിഫിഡിഎഫ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പണിയുന്നതിനുള്ള ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d പരിഭാഷണമാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ WMT-16 ബിലിങ്ങുള്ള രേഖയില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dത്ത ടാസ്ക് ബെന്\u200dച്ച്മെന്\u200dറ് ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d സിഡിഎ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ് കൂടാതെ, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ട് വെബ് സ്കേല്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിട്ടുണ്ട്. സിഡിയുടെ വസ്ത്രം പരിശോധിക്കാനാണ് സിഡിയുടെ ആസ്ഥാനത പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് സിഡിയാണ് റോബ്സ്റ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നത്, വിലപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d കഴിയുന്നത്, വലിയ വെബ് ഡാറ്റാ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια προσέγγιση ευθυγράμμισης εγγράφων βασισμένη στο περιεχόμενο (μια αποτελεσματική μέθοδος ευθυγράμμισης πολυγλωσσικών ιστοσελίδων βασισμένων στο περιεχόμενο για τη δημιουργία δεδομένων παράλληλης κατάρτισης για συστήματα μηχανικής μετάφρασης (ΜΤ) που λειτουργούν σε βιομηχανικό επίπεδο. Το CDA λειτουργεί σε δύο στάδια: (i) προβολή εγγράφων ενός δικτυακού τομέα σε κοινόχρηστο πολύγλωσσο χώρο· στη συνέχεια (ii) ευθυγράμμισή τους με βάση την ομοιότητα των αναπαραστάσεων τους σε τέτοιο χώρο. Χρησιμοποιούμε λεξικά μοντέλα μετάφρασης για να χτίσουμε διανυσματικές αναπαραστάσεις χρησιμοποιώντας το TFIDF. Το επιτυγχάνει απόδοση συγκρίσιμη με τα σύγχρονα συστήματα στο σημείο αναφοράς κοινής εργασίας ευθυγράμμισης εγγράφων δίγλωσσων εγγράφων ενώ λειτουργεί σε πολύγλωσσο χώρο. Εκτός αυτού, δημιουργήσαμε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων σε διαδικτυακή κλίμακα για να εξετάσουμε την αξιοπιστία του σε ένα βιομηχανικό περιβάλλον που περιλαμβάνει έως και 28 γλώσσες και εκατομμύρια έγγραφα. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι το CDA είναι ανθεκτικό, οικονομικά αποδοτικό και είναι σημαντικά ανώτερο (i) στην επεξεργασία μεγάλων και θορυβωδών δεδομένων ιστού και (ii) στην κλιμάκωση σε νέες γλώσσες με χαμηλούς πόρους.', 'mt': 'Aħna nintroduċu approċċ ta’ Allinjament tad-Dokumenti bbażat fuq il-Kontenut (CDA), metodu effiċjenti biex jiġu allinjati d-dokumenti multilingwi tal-internet ibbażati fuq il-kontenut fil-ħolqien ta’ dejta parallel a ta’ taħriġ għal sistemi ta’ traduzzjoni bil-magni (MT) li joperaw fil-livell industrijali. Is-CDA taħdem f’żewġ stadji: (i) tipproġetta dokumenti ta’ dominju tal-web għal spazju multilingwi kondiviż; imbagħad (ii) jallinjahom abbażi tas-similarità tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet tagħhom f’tali spazju. Nixprunaw mudelli ta’ traduzzjoni lexika biex nibnu rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-vetturi bl-użu tat-TFIDF. Is-CDA tikseb prestazzjoni komparabbli mas-sistemi l-aktar avvanzati fid-WMT-16 Bilingual Document Alignment Shared Task benchmark waqt li topera fi spazju multilingwi. Barra minn hekk, aħna ħolqu żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta fuq skala tal-internet biex jeżaminaw is-robustezza tas-CDA f’ambjent industrijali li jinvolvi sa 28 lingwa u miljuni ta’ dokumenti. L-esperimenti juru li s-CDA huwa robust, kosteffettiv, u huwa sostanzjalment superjuri fl-ipproċessar ta’ (i) dejta web kbira u storbjuża u (ii) l-iskala għal lingwi ġodda u b’riżorsi baxxi.', 'no': 'We introduce a Content-based Document Alignment approach (CDA), an efficient method to align multilingual web documents based on content in creating parallel training data for machine translation (MT) systems operating at the industrial level. Name ii) justerer dei basert på liknande representasjonane sine i slik plass. Vi leverer leksiske omsetjingsmodular for å bygge vektorrepresentasjonar med TFIDF. CDA oppnår utviklinga sammenlignbar med status- of- the- art systems i WMT- 16 Bilingual Document Alignment Shared Task benchmark mens det fungerer i multilingual space. I tillegg oppretta vi to datasett for å undersøke kraftigheten av CDA i eit industriell innstilling som inneheld opp til 28 språk og millioner av dokument. Eksperimentane viser at CDA er sterkt, kostnadseffektiv, og er betydelig høgare i prosessering av store og støy nettdata og ii) skalering til nye og låg ressurserte språk.', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy podejście Content-based Document Alignment (CDA), skuteczną metodę dostosowania wielojęzycznych dokumentów internetowych opartych na treściach w tworzeniu równoległych danych szkoleniowych dla systemów tłumaczenia maszynowego (MT) działających na poziomie przemysłowym. CDA działa w dwóch etapach: (i) projektowanie dokumentów domeny internetowej do wspólnej przestrzeni wielojęzycznej; następnie (ii) dostosowanie ich na podstawie podobieństwa ich reprezentacji w takiej przestrzeni. Wykorzystujemy leksykalne modele tłumaczeń do budowania reprezentacji wektorowych przy użyciu TFIDF. CDA osiąga wydajność porównywalną z najnowocześniejszymi systemami w standardzie WMT-16 Dwujęzycznego wyrównania dokumentów współdzielonych zadań podczas pracy w przestrzeni wielojęzycznej. Poza tym stworzyliśmy dwa zbiory danych w skali internetowej, aby zbadać solidność CDA w otoczeniu przemysłowym obejmującym nawet 28-języki i miliony dokumentów. Eksperymenty pokazują, że CDA jest solidny, opłacalny i znacznie lepszy w (i) przetwarzaniu dużych i szumownych danych internetowych oraz (ii) skalowaniu do nowych języków o niskich zasobach.', 'mn': 'Бид Content-based Document Alignment approach (CDA), олон хэлний веб баримтуудыг бүтээмж дээр зэрэгцээ суралцах өгөгдлийг үйлдвэрлэлийн түвшинд ажилладаг машин хөгжүүлэх (MT) системийн зэрэгцээ боловсруулахын тулд бүтээгдэхүүний төвшинд багтаж CDA хоёр алхам дээр ажилладаг: (i) веб-домжны баримтуудыг олон хэлний орон зайд хуваалцах юм. ii) тэднийг ийм орон зайд илэрхийллийн төстэй төстэй байгуулах юм. Бид TFIDF-г ашиглан векторын үзүүлэлтийг бий болгохын тулд лексикийн орчуулах загваруудыг ашиглаж байна. CDA WMT-16 Хоёрдугаар Документын Төргөлдөр Хөлдөр Тапсын Төргөлдөр олон хэлний орон зайд ажиллах үед үйл ажиллагаатай харьцуулагдах үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг. Үүнээс гадна бид хоёр веб-хэмжээний өгөгдлийн сангуудыг бүтээсэн. CDA-ын хүчтэй байдлыг аж үйлдвэрлэлийн байгууллагын тулд 28 хэл болон сая сая баримт бүтээсэн. Үүний туршилтууд CDA нь хүчтэй, үнэ цэнэтэй, үнэ цэнэтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна. i) том, чимээгүй веб өгөгдлийн талаар ажиллаж, ii) шинэ, бага хүчтэй хэлнүүд рүү шилжүүлж байна.', 'ro': 'Introducem o abordare de aliniere a documentelor bazată pe conținut (CDA), o metodă eficientă de aliniere a documentelor web multilingve bazate pe conținut în crearea de date de instruire paralelă pentru sistemele de traducere automată (MT) care funcționează la nivel industrial. CDA lucrează în două etape: (i) proiectarea documentelor unui domeniu web într-un spațiu multilingv comun; apoi (ii) alinierea lor pe baza similarității reprezentărilor lor în acest spațiu. Folosim modele de traducere lexicală pentru a construi reprezentări vectoriale folosind TFIDF. CDA obține performanțe comparabile cu sistemele de ultimă generație din standardul WMT-16 Bilingual Document Alignment Shared Task în timp ce operează în spațiu multilingv. În plus, am creat două seturi de date la scară web pentru a examina robustețea CDA într-un cadru industrial care implică până la 28 de limbi și milioane de documente. Experimentele arată că CDA este robust, rentabil și este semnificativ superior în (i) procesarea datelor web mari și zgomotoase și (ii) scalare la limbaje noi și cu resurse reduse.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo pristup pripravnosti dokumenta na sadržaju (CDA), efikasan metod za usklađivanje multijezičkih web dokumenta na temelju sadržaja u stvaranju paralelnih podataka obuke za sisteme prevoda mašin a (MT) koji rade na industrijskoj nivou. CDA radi na dva koraka: i) projekcija dokumenta web domena na zajednički višejezički prostor; i) poravnati ih na temelju sličnosti njihovih predstavljanja u tom prostoru. Učinimo leksičke modele prevoda da izgradimo predstave vektora koristeći TFIDF. CDA postiže usporedbu sa stanjem umetničkih sustava u WMT-16 Bilingualnom standardu podeljenih zadataka dok radi u multijezičkom prostoru. Osim toga, stvorili smo dve mrežne podatke kako bi pregledali robotu CDA u industrijskom postavljanju uključujući do 28 jezika i milijuna dokumenta. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je CDA jačan, koštan efikasan, i značajno superior u procesu velikih i buknih web podataka i ii) skaliranju na nove i niske resurse jezike.', 'so': 'Waxaannu soo bandhignaynaa qaab sawir ah oo ku qoran dukumentiyada qoraalka (CDA), taas oo ah qaab faa’iido ah oo ku sameynaya dukumentiyada internetka oo luuqadaha kala duduwan, taasoo ku saleysan macluumaadka ku saabsan sameynta macluumaadka waxbarashada si siman looga sameynayo nidaamka turjumidda machine (MT) ee ka shaqeeya heerka ganacsiga CDA works in two steps: (i) projecting documents of a web domain to a shared multilingual space;  subax oo ku saleysan qaab u eg qofka ka mid ah meeshaas. Tilmaamaha turjumidda leksikal ah ee aan u sameyno qaabilaada vector oo ku qoraya isticmaalka TFIDF. CDA wuxuu sameynayaa sameynta si u eg nidaamka farshaxanka ee WMT-16 Bilingual Document Alignment Shared Tax Banchmark while operating in luqadaha kala duduwan. Taas waxaa kale oo aan sameynay laba koosaar oo macluumaad ah ee internetka si aan u baaritaan dharka CDA oo ku qoran qoraal ganacsi oo ku qoran ilaa 28 luqadood iyo millioner oo dukumenti. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in CDA uu yahay kharash iyo kharash, wuxuuna ka sarreeyaa (i) macluumaad aad u weyn oo cod ah bogagga internetka iyo (ii) si uu u qiyaasayo luuqadaha cusub iyo kuwa nooca badan.', 'si': 'අපි සම්බන්ධ විස්තාරයක් ආධාරිත විස්තාරයක් (CDA), ව්\u200dයාපාරිත්ති ස්ථානයේ වැඩි භාෂාවික වෙබ් විස්තාරයක් සඳහා සමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නය CDA පද්ධති දෙකකින් වැඩ කරන්න: (i) වෙබ් ඩෝමින්ගේ ලිපිණිය ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරමණය කරනවා භාෂාභාෂාත්මක අවසා ඊට පස්සේ (2) ඔවුන්ව මෙතන අවසානයේ ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන වගේ සාමාන්\u200dයතාවට අධිරූපය කරන්න. අපි ලෙක්සිකාලික වාර්ථාව මදුල්යුවක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා TFIDF භාවිතා වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරතිනිශ්ණා Name ඒ වගේම, අපි වෙබ් ස්කේල් දත්ත සැට් දෙකක් නිර්මාණය කරලා CDA ගේ ශක්තිමතාව පරීක්ෂා කරන්න ව්\u200dයාපාරික සැකසුම් වලින් වලින පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ CDA නිර්භාවිතයි, විශ්වාසයි, සම්පූර්ණයි, ඒ වගේම ලොකු සහ ශබ්දයි වෙබ් දත්ත සහ (i) අළුත් සහ අඩු සම්පූ', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar en Content-based Document Alignment approach (CDA), en effektiv metod för att anpassa flerspråkiga webbdokument baserat på innehåll för att skapa parallella utbildningsdata för maskinöversättningssystem som arbetar på industriell nivå. CDA arbetar i två steg: (i) projicera dokument från en webbdomän till ett gemensamt flerspråkigt utrymme; sedan (ii) anpassa dem baserat på likheten mellan deras representationer i ett sådant utrymme. Vi använder lexikala översättningsmodeller för att bygga vektorrepresentationer med TFIDF. CDA uppnår prestanda jämförbar med de senaste systemen i WMT-16 tvåspråkig dokumentjustering delad aktivitet benchmark medan den arbetar i flerspråkig utrymme. Dessutom skapade vi två dataset i webbskala för att undersöka CDA:s robusthet i en industriell miljö med upp till 28 språk och miljontals dokument. Experimenten visar att CDA är robust, kostnadseffektiv och är betydligt överlägset i (i) bearbetning av stora och bullriga webbdata och (ii) skalning till nya och lågresursspråk.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு உள்ளடக்கமான ஆவணம் ஒழுங்குபடுத்தல் செயல்பாடு (CDA), தொழில்நிலையில் செயல்படும் இயந்திர மொழிமாற்றல் முறைமைகளுக்கு இணைய பயிற்சி தரவை உருவாக்குவதற்கான ஒரு பயன Name (ii) பின்னர் அவர்களுடைய பிரிவுகளின் ஒத்திசையை அடிப்படையில் ஒத்திசைப்படுத்துகிறது. TFIDF பயன்படுத்தி வெக்டார் பிரதிநிதிகளை உருவாக்குவதற்கான லெக்சிக்கல் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மாதிரிகளை நா CDA achieves performance comparable with state-of-the-art systems in the WMT-16 Bilingual Document Alignment Shared Task benchmark while operating in multilingual space.  அதற்கும் மேலும், நாங்கள் சிடிஏ ஆடையை சரிபார்க்க இரண்டு இணைய அளவு தரவு அமைப்புகளை உருவாக்கினோம் 28 மொழிகள் மற்றும் மில்லியன் ஆவணங்கள்  இந்த சோதனைகள் CDA செலவு செயல்படுத்தப்படுகிறது என்பதை காண்பிக்கிறது, மற்றும் பெரிய மற்றும் சப்தமான இணைய தகவல்', 'ur': 'ہم نے ایک منزل کی بنیادی دکھانے کی Alignment approach (CDA) کو معلوم کریں، ایک مفید طریقہ ہے کہ بہت سی زبان ویب دکھانے پر منزلت کے ذریعہ مشترک ترینسی ڈیٹے بنانے کے لئے ماشین ترینسی (MT) سیستموں کے لئے منزلت سطح پر عمل کریں۔ CDA دو قدم میں کام کرتا ہے: (i) ایک ویب ڈومین کے لاسوندوں کو ایک مشترک ملتی زبان جگہ پر پروژیک کرتا ہے۔ پھر اُن کی مثال اُن کی جگہ کے مطابق اُن کی مثال کے مطابق ٹھیک ٹھیک ٹھیک کر دیتے ہیں ہم لکسیکل ترجمہ موڈل کو TFIDF کے مطابق ویکتور روشنی بنانے کے لئے استعمال کرتے ہیں. CDA WMT-16 Bilingual Document Alignment Shared Task benchmark کے وقت multilingual space میں فعال کرتا ہے۔ اس کے علاوہ ہم نے دو ویب اسکیل ڈیٹ سٹ پیدا کیے کہ CDA کی طاقت کی تحقیق کریں ایک صنعتی سیٹ میں 28 زبان اور لاکھوں سند کے ساتھ۔ آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ سی ڈی ا مضبوط ہے، قیمت کے مطابق، اور اس میں بہت زیادہ زیادہ زیادہ ہے جو بڑی اور غروب ویب ڈیٹا اور (i i) نئی اور کم رسسورٹ زبانوں میں استعمال کرتی ہے۔', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một phương pháp liên minh Tài liệu theo nội dung (CDO), một phương pháp hiệu quả để kết hợp các tài liệu mạng đa dạng, dựa trên nội dung tạo ra các dữ liệu huấn luyện song song cho các hệ thống dịch chuyển máy (MTV) đang hoạt động ở cấp công nghiệp. CDE hoạt động trong hai bước: i) Chiếu tài liệu về một miền web vào một vũ trụ đa dạng rộng chia sẻ; Sau đó, liền căn cứ dựa trên sự giống nhau của các biểu tượng của họ trong khoảng không này. Chúng tôi sử dụng các mô hình dịch ngôn ngữ để xây dựng các biểu tượng vector Đội CDO đạt được khả năng tương đương với hệ thống hiện đại trong tập đoàn Kết nạp Tài liệu Độ Công tác chia sẻ file lần này trong khi hoạt động ở vũ trụ đa dạng. Bên cạnh đó, chúng tôi đã tạo ra hai bộ dữ liệu trên mạng để kiểm tra sự vững chắc của CDO trong một tổ chức công nghiệp gồm cả tầng tám và hàng triệu tài liệu. Các thí nghiệm cho thấy CDE rất mạnh, hiệu quả giá trị, và còn cao hơn nhiều trong việc xử lý dữ liệu mạng lớn và ồn ào,', 'uz': "Biz tarkibi hujjatni tahrirlash usulini (CDA) qilamiz, industrial darajada ishlayotgan bir necha tildagi hujjatlarni yaratish mumkin. Name keyin ularni shunday joydagi xususiyatlarning turini aniqlash mumkin. Biz TFIDF yordamida vektor representlarini yaratish uchun leksikal tarjima modellarini yozib qo'yishingiz. CDA achieves performance comparable with state-of-the-art systems in the WMT-16 Bilingual Document Alignment Shared Task benchmark while operating in multilingual space.  Biz ikkita veb- balandlik maʼlumotlar tarkibini yaratdik, CDA'ning ko'plagini o'rganish uchun 28 tillar va millionlab hujjatlarga o'rganish kerak. Name", 'bg': 'Въвеждаме подход за подравняване на документите, базиран на съдържание, ефективен метод за подравняване на многоезични уеб документи въз основа на съдържание при създаването на паралелни данни за обучение за системи за машинен превод (МТ), работещи на индустриално ниво. ЦЗД работи в две стъпки: проектиране на документи на уеб домейн в споделено многоезично пространство; след това (ii) ги подравняване въз основа на сходството на техните представи в такова пространство. Ние използваме лексикални преводни модели, за да изградим векторни представи, използвайки TFIDF. CDA постига резултати, сравними с най-съвременните системи в двуезичното подравняване на документи за споделена задача, докато работи в многоезично пространство. Освен това създадохме два уеб-мащабни набора данни, за да изследваме здравината на CDA в индустриална среда, включваща до 28 езика и милиони документи. Експериментите показват, че CDA е стабилна, рентабилна и значително по-добра при (i) обработка на големи и шумни уеб данни и (ii) мащабиране на нови и нискоресурсни езици.', 'nl': 'We introduceren een Content-based Document Alignment aanpak (CDA), een efficiënte methode om meertalige webdocumenten op basis van content af te stemmen bij het creëren van parallelle trainingsgegevens voor machinevertaalsystemen (MT) die op industrieel niveau werken. CDA werkt in twee stappen: (i) documenten van een webdomein projecteren naar een gedeelde meertalige ruimte; ii) ze op elkaar afstemmen op basis van de gelijkenis van hun representaties in die ruimte. We gebruiken lexicale vertaalmodellen om vectorrepresentaties te bouwen met behulp van TFIDF. CDA bereikt prestaties vergelijkbaar met de state-of-the-art systemen in de WMT-16 Bilingual Document Alignment Shared Task benchmark terwijl het in meertalige ruimte werkt. Daarnaast hebben we twee web-scale datasets gemaakt om de robuustheid van CDA te onderzoeken in een industriële omgeving met maximaal 28-talen en miljoenen documenten. De experimenten tonen aan dat CDA robuust, kosteneffectief is en aanzienlijk superieur is in (i) het verwerken van grote en lawaaierige webdata en (ii) schalen naar nieuwe en lage resources talen.', 'hr': 'Upoznajemo pristup pripreme za rješavanje dokumenta na sadržaju (CDA), učinkovit način za usklađivanje multijezičkih web dokumenta na temelju sadržaja u stvaranju paralelnih podataka obuke za sustave prevoda strojeva (MT) koji djeluju na industrijskoj razini. CDA radi na dva koraka: i) projektiranje dokumenta web domena na zajednički višejezički prostor; i) poravnati ih na temelju sličnosti njihovih predstavljanja u tom prostoru. Učinimo leksičke modele prevoda za izgradnju predstavljanja vektora koristeći TFIDF. CDA postiže usporedbu s sustavima stanja umjetnosti u WMT-16 Bilingualnom kriteriji za usporedbu zajedničkih zadataka tijekom djelovanja u multijezičkom prostoru. Osim toga, stvorili smo dvije mrežne podatke kako bi pregledali snagu CDA-a u industrijskom postavljanju uključujući do 28 jezika i milijuna dokumenta. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je CDA jačan, koštan učinkovit i značajno superior u obradi velikih i bukovih web podataka i ii) skaliranju na nove i niske resurse jezike.', 'de': 'Wir führen einen Content-based Document Alignment Ansatz (CDA) ein, eine effiziente Methode zur inhaltlichen Ausrichtung mehrsprachiger Webdokumente bei der Erstellung paralleler Trainingsdaten für maschinelle Übersetzungssysteme (MT) auf industrieller Ebene. CDA arbeitet in zwei Schritten: (i) Projektion von Dokumenten einer Web-Domain auf einen gemeinsamen mehrsprachigen Raum; dann (ii) sie auf der Grundlage der Ähnlichkeit ihrer Darstellungen in einem solchen Raum auszurichten. Wir nutzen lexikalische Übersetzungsmodelle, um Vektordarstellungen mit TFIDF zu erstellen. CDA erreicht eine Leistung, die mit den modernsten Systemen im WMT-16 Bilingual Document Alignment Shared Task Benchmark vergleichbar ist, während es in mehrsprachigem Raum arbeitet. Außerdem haben wir zwei webbasierte Datensätze erstellt, um die Robustheit von CDA in einem industriellen Umfeld mit bis zu 28-Sprachen und Millionen von Dokumenten zu untersuchen. Die Experimente zeigen, dass CDA robust, kosteneffizient und deutlich überlegen ist, wenn es um (i) die Verarbeitung großer und lauter Webdaten und (ii) die Skalierung auf neue und ressourcenarme Sprachen geht.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan Penjajaran Dokumen berdasarkan isi (CDA), metode efisien untuk menyesuaikan dokumen web berbagai bahasa berdasarkan isi dalam menciptakan data latihan paralel untuk sistem terjemahan mesin (MT) yang beroperasi di tingkat industri. CDA bekerja dalam dua langkah: (i) memproyeksikan dokumen domain web ke ruang berbagai bahasa; Kemudian (ii) menyesuaikan mereka berdasarkan persamaan dari perwakilan mereka di ruang itu. We leverage lexical translation models to build vector representations using TFIDF.  CDA mencapai prestasi yang dapat dibandingkan dengan sistem state-of-the-art di WMT-16 Bilingual Document Alignment Shared Task benchmark sementara beroperasi di ruang berbilang bahasa. Selain itu, kami menciptakan dua set data skala web untuk memeriksa kekuatan CDA dalam sebuah persediaan industri yang melibatkan sampai 28 bahasa dan jutaan dokumen. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa CDA kuat, efektif pada biaya, dan jauh lebih tinggi dalam (i) memproses data web yang besar dan berisik dan (ii) mengungkap ke bahasa baru dan bahasa yang memiliki sumber daya rendah.', 'fa': 'ما یک روش تنظیم سند (CDA) بر اساس محتوای معرفی می\u200cکنیم، یک روش موثرت برای تنظیم سند وب\u200cهای متعدد زبان بر اساس محتوای در ایجاد داده\u200cهای آموزش متعدد برای سیستم\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین (MT) که در سطح صنعتی کار می\u200cکنند. CDA در دو قدم کار می\u200cکند: i) پروژه\u200cسازی مدارک یک دامین وب به فضای متوسط زبان مشترک می\u200cکند. سپس (ii) بر اساس شبیه نمایش\u200cهایشان در این فضا تطبیق می\u200cکنند. ما مدل ترجمه\u200cهای زبانی را برای ساختن نمایش\u200cهای ویکتور با استفاده از TFIDF استفاده می\u200cکنیم. CDA اجرای قابل مقایسه با سیستم\u200cهای موقعیت هنر در تنظیم سند WMT-16 دوگانه مشترک کار مشترک در زمان عملکرد در فضای بسیاری زبان می\u200cرسد. علاوه بر این، ما دو مجموعه داده\u200cهای مقیاس وب را برای تحقیق قوی CDA در یک تنظیم صنعتی که شامل به ۲۸ زبان و میلیون\u200cها سند است ایجاد کردیم. آزمایش ها نشان می دهند که سی\u200cدی\u200cای قدرتمند، قابل تأثیر هزینه است و در حالی که (i) داده\u200cهای وب بزرگ و صدا و (ii) مقیاس به زبان\u200cهای جدید و کم منابع است.', 'ko': '우리는 내용 기반의 문서 정렬 방법(CDA)을 소개했는데 이것은 내용 기반의 다중 언어 웹 문서를 정렬하는 효과적인 방법으로 공업급 기계번역(MT) 시스템에 병행 훈련 데이터를 만드는 데 사용된다.CDA는 두 단계로 나뉜다. (i) 웹 영역의 문서를 공유된 다중 언어 공간에 투영한다.그리고 (ii) 이 공간에서 표시된 유사성에 따라 정렬합니다.우리는 어휘 번역 모델을 이용하여 TFIDF를 이용하여 벡터 표시를 구축한다.CDA가 다중 언어 공간에서 실행될 때 WMT-16 이중 언어 문서에서 공유 작업 기준에 맞는 성능은 가장 선진적인 시스템과 견줄 만하다.또한 28개 언어와 수백만 개의 문서가 포함된 산업 환경에서 CDA의 건장성을 검사하기 위해 두 개의 네트워크 규모의 데이터 세트를 만들었습니다.실험에 의하면 CDA는 건장하고 경제적이며 효율적이며 (i) 대형과 시끄러운 웹 데이터를 처리하고 (ii) 새로운 자원과 부족한 언어로 확장하는 데 CDA보다 현저히 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer en Content-based Document Alignment approach (CDA), en effektiv metode til at justere flersprogede webdokumenter baseret på indhold ved at skabe parallelle træningsdata for maskinoversættelsessystemer, der opererer på industrielt niveau. CDA arbejder i to trin: (i) projicere dokumenter fra et webdomæne til et fælles flersproget rum; derefter (ii) tilpasning af dem baseret på ligheden mellem deres repræsentationer i et sådant rum. Vi udnytter leksikalske oversættelsesmodeller til at opbygge vektorrepræsentationer ved hjælp af TFIDF. CDA opnår ydeevne sammenlignelig med state-of-the-art systemer i WMT-16 Tosproget Document Alignment Shared Task benchmark, mens de opererer i flersproget rum. Desuden har vi skabt to datasæt i web-skala for at undersøge robustheden af CDA i en industriel miljø med op til 28 sprog og millioner af dokumenter. Eksperimenterne viser, at CDA er robust, omkostningseffektiv og er betydeligt bedre i (i) behandling af store og støjende webdata og (ii) skalering til nye sprog med lav ressource.', 'af': "Ons introduseer 'n Inhoud-gebaseerde Dokument Aanligting toegang (CDA), ' n effektief metode om multitaalse web dokumente te aligneer wat op inhoud gebaseer word in die skep van parallele oerwinning data vir masjien vertaling (MT) stelsels wat op die industriele vlak bestuur. CDA werk in twee stappe: (i) projekteer dokumente van 'n web domein na' n gedeelde multilingse spasie; dan (ii) hulle gelyk op die gelykenis van hulle voorstellings in sodanige spasie. Ons verwyder leksiese vertalingsmodelles om vektorvoorstellings te bou deur TFIDF te gebruik. CDA bereik prestasie vergelykbaar met staat- of- the- art stelsels in die WMT- 16 Bilinguele Dokument Oplyn Gedeelde Opdrag- benchmark terwyl werk in multilingse spasie. Ons het ook twee web-skaal datastelle geskep om die kragtigheid van CDA te ondersoek in 'n industriese instelling wat tot 28 tale en miljoene dokumente invoer. Die eksperimente vertoon dat CDA sterk is, koste-effektief, en is betekenlik superior in (i) die verwerking van groot en geluide web data en (ii) skalering na nuwe en lae-hulpbron tale.", 'tr': "Biz Content-based Document Alignment approach (CDA), sanayir derejesinde işleýän sistemleri üçin paralel okuwçy maglumaty bejermek üçin bir täsirli täsirli web senedi çykarmak üçin guruldyrylýarys. CDA iki adımda i şleýär: (i) web domenyň senedlerini bir beýleki dilli seleňe tassyklamak; Sonra da (ii) bu şekilde ifadelerinin benzerliğine dayanıyorlar. TFIDF kullanarak vektör temsilleri inşa etmek için lektik terjime modellerini yaratıyoruz. CDA WMT-16 Bilingual Sened Döwletleriniň ýerini multi dilli seleňde işleýän wagtynda sungat sistemleri bilen karşılaşýar. Munuň ýagdaýda, CDA'nyň güýçlidigini senagat çykarmak üçin iki web ölçekli veri setirlerini 28 dile we milyonlaryň bir senedi barlamak üçin bejerdik. Synaglar CDA ukypdyr, täsir-täsirli we (i) uly we sesli web maglumatyny i şleýändir we (ii) täze we ýok dillere golaýlaýar.", 'am': 'የሰነዱ ሰነድ መተላለፊያ (CDA)፣ የኢንተርኔት ደረጃዎች ላይ ለሚያሳተሙ የድምፅ ማህበረሰብ (MT) ስርዓት ማስተያየት (MT) ስርዓት በሚያሳየው የብዙ ቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች ሰነጃዎችን ለመቀላቀል የሚችል የጥያቄ ሥርዓት ነው፡፡ CDA በሁለት ደረጃዎች ላይ ይሠራል:(i) የዌብ ዶሜን ሰነዶች ለመጠቀም በብዙ ቋንቋ ስፍራን ያሳያል፡ በኋላም እንደዚህ ስፍራቸው በሚመስል መጠቀም በማስተካከል TFIDF በመጠቀም የሜክሲካዊ ትርጉም ሞዴላዎችን ለመሥራት እናደርጋለን፡፡ CDA በWMT-16 Bilingual Document የተሰራጨ ስራ benchmark while በmultilingual space ውስጥ በመስጠት ይተካክላል፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ የCDA ልብስ በ28 ቋንቋዎች እና ሚሊዮን ሰነዶች በሚያያያዩ የኢንተርኔት አካባቢ ውስጥ መፍጠር ሁለት የመረጃ ዳታተሮች ፈጠርን፡፡ ፈተናዎቹ የCDA መዝገብ፣ ዋጋው የበለጠ ነው፣ (i) ትልቅ እና ድምፅ የድምፅ መረጃዎችን በመስመር እና (ii) በአዲስ እና የተከፈለ ቋንቋዎችን በመስመር ይሻላል፡፡', 'sw': 'We introduce a Content-based Document Alignment approach (CDA), an efficient method to align multilingual web documents based on content in creating parallel training data for machine translation (MT) systems operating at the industrial level.  CDA inafanya kazi katika hatua mbili: (i) kuandaa nyaraka za tovuti kwa ajili ya sehemu mbalimbali za lugha; ili) kuwatambua kwa msingi wa mfano wa uwakilishi katika nafasi hiyo. Tunaweza kutumia mifano ya tafsiri ya lexico ili kutengeneza uwakilishi wa vector kwa kutumia TFIDF. CDA inafanikiwa utendaji uliofanana na mifumo ya sanaa katika nyaraka ya Ujumuishaji kwa lugha ya WMT-16 iliyoshirikisha kazi wakati wakifanya kazi katika nafasi ya lugha mbalimbali. Zaidi ya hayo, tulitengeneza seti za takwimu mbili za mtandaoni ili kuchunguza nguo za CDA katika mazingira ya viwanda yanayohusisha lugha 28 na mamilioni ya nyaraka. Majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa CDA ni uchochezi, yenye ufanisi wa gharama, na ni bora zaidi katika (i) kupambana na taarifa kubwa na kelele za mtandaoni na (ii) zinazidi kupunguza lugha mpya na zenye rasilimali zisizo na maana ya chini.', 'sq': 'Ne futim një qasje të përshtatjes së dokumenteve me bazë në përmbajtje (CDA), një metodë efikase për të përshtatur dokumentet shumëgjuhëse të internetit bazuar në përmbajtje në krijimin e të dhënave paralele të trainimit për sistemet e përkthimit të makinave (MT) që funksionojnë në nivel industrial. CDA works in two steps: (i) projecting documents of a web domain to a shared multilingual space;  pastaj (ii) t’i rendit ata në bazë të ngjashmërisë së përfaqësimeve të tyre në këtë hapësirë. Ne përdorim modelet e përkthimit lexik për të ndërtuar përfaqësime vektorësh duke përdorur TFIDF. CDA arrin performancë të krahasueshme me sistemet më të larta në WMT-16 Bilingual Document Alignment Shared Task benchmark ndërsa punon në hapësirë shumëgjuhëse. Përveç kësaj, krijuam dy grupe të dhënash në shkallë interneti për të shqyrtuar fuqinë e CDA në një strukturë industriale që përfshin deri në 28 gjuhë dhe miliona dokumente. Eksperimentet tregojnë se CDA është e fortë, kosto-efektive dhe është në mënyrë të konsiderueshme më e lartë në (i) përpunimin e të dhënave të mëdha dhe të zhurmshme të internetit dhe (ii) shkallëzimin në gjuhë të reja dhe me burime të ulëta.', 'az': "Biz Content-based Document Alignment approach (CDA) ilə müxtəlif dilli web belgelerini müəyyən etmək üçün məlumatların üstündə paralel təhsil məlumatları yaratmaq üçün maşın tercümə sistemlərinin (MT) sistemlərini təşkil edirik. CDA iki adım i çində çalışır: i) web domeinin səhifələrini paylaşıb çoxlu dil alanına təşkil edir; Sonra da onları bu yerdə göstərilənlərin bənzərinə görə çəkin. Biz TFIDF vasitəsilə vektor göstəriciləri inşa etmək üçün leksik çevirim modellerini yaradırıq. CDA WMT-16 Bilinçi Döküman İzləməsi İzləməsi İzləməsi Bölünən Task Benchmarkı ilə müqayisədə müəyyən ediləni başa düşür. Buna istisna olmaqla, biz CDA'nin güclüyünü 28 dilə və milyonlarla belə yazılmış endüstriyyə qurulması üçün iki web ölçü veri quruluşu yaratdıq. Testlər CDA qüvvətli, qiymətli və i ilə böyük, səslü web məlumatlarını və ii ilə yeni və düşük qüvvətli dillərə təşkil etməkdə çox üstündür.", 'bn': 'মেশিন অনুবাদ (এমটি) ব্যবস্থার প্যালেলাল ট্রেনিং ডাটা তৈরি করার জন্য মেশিন অনুবাদের (এমটি) সিস্টেম ব্যবস্থার ক্ষেত্রে কার্যকর প্রশিক্ষণ সৃষ্টি করার জন্য আমর সিডিএ দুই পদক্ষেপে কাজ করে: (i) একটি ওয়েব ডোমেইনের নথিপত্র শেয়ার করা বহুভাষাভাষী জায়গায় প্রকল্প করে; তারপর তাদের এই ধরনের জায়গায় তাদের প্রতিনিধিত্বের অনুরূপ ভিত্তিতে চিহ্নিত করা হয়। টিএফআইডিএফ ব্যবহার করে ভেক্টর প্রতিনিধিত্ব নির্মাণ করার জন্য আমরা লেক্সিক্যাল অনুবাদ মডেল বানাই। উইএমটি-১৬ বিলিঙ্গুয়াল ডকুমেন্ট শেয়ার করা কাজের বেঞ্চার্ম্যাক্স ব্যবস্থার সমতুল্য সিডিএ প্রদর্শন করেছে। এছাড়াও, আমরা ওয়েব-স্ক্যালের দুটি ডাটাসেট তৈরি করেছি যাতে সিডিএ-র পোশাক পরীক্ষা করা হয়েছে, যার মধ্যে ২৮ ভাষা এবং লক্ষ লক্ষ নথিপত্র The experiments show that CDA is robust, cost-effective, and is significantly superior in (i) processing large and noisy web data and (ii) scaling to new and low-resourced languages.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք փաստաթղթերի պարունակության հիմնված հարմարեցման մոտեցում (CDA), մի արդյունավետ մեթոդ բազլեզու վեբ փաստաթղթերի հարմարեցման համար, հիմնված պարունակության վրա, ստեղծելով զուգահեռ ուսումնասիրության տվյալներ մեքենայի թարգմանման CDA-ն աշխատում է երկու քայլերով. i) վեբ-բնագավառի փաստաթղթերի պրոյեկցիան ընդհանուր բազլեզու տարածքում, ապա (II) դրանք հավասարեցնելու հիմնվելով նրանց ներկայացումների նմանության վրա: Մենք օգտագործում ենք լեքսիկական թարգմանման մոդելներ, որպեսզի կառուցենք վեկտորների ներկայացումներ օգտագործելով ԹՖԻԴՖ: CDA-ը հասնում է աշխատանքի համեմատական արտադրողություններին, որոնք համեմատում են ամենաբարձր համակարգերի հետ, աշխատում են աշխատանքի ժամանակ բազլեզու տարածքում, համապատասխանատվությունը երկլեզու փաստաթղթերի համապատասխանատվությունը: Ավելին, մենք ստեղծեցինք երկու վեբ-սանդղային տվյալների համակարգ, որպեսզի ուսումնասիրենք CDA-ի կայունությունը արդյունաբերական միջավայրում, որը ներառում է մինչև 28 լեզու և միլիոնավոր փաստաթղթեր: Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ CDA-ն ուժեղ է, գնահատականորեն արդյունավետ և կարևոր գերազանցում է i) մեծ և աղմկոտ վեբ տվյալների վերաբերյալ և II) նոր և ցածր ռեսուրսներ ունեցող լեզուների մեջ:', 'cs': 'Představujeme přístup Content-based Document Alignment (CDA), efektivní metodu sladění vícejazyčných webových dokumentů založených na obsahu při vytváření paralelních školicích dat pro strojový překlad (MT) systémy fungující na průmyslové úrovni. CDA funguje ve dvou krocích: (i) projektování dokumentů webové domény do sdíleného vícejazyčného prostoru; potom ii) jejich srovnání na základě podobnosti jejich reprezentací v takovém prostoru. Využíváme lexikální překladové modely k tvorbě vektorových reprezentací pomocí TFIDF. CDA dosahuje výkonu srovnatelného s nejmodernějšími systémy WMT-16 Bilingual Document Alignment Shared Task Benchmark při provozu ve vícejazyčném prostoru. Kromě toho jsme vytvořili dva webové datové sady pro zkoumání robustnosti CDA v průmyslovém prostředí zahrnujícím až 28 jazyky a miliony dokumentů. Experimenty ukazují, že CDA je robustní, nákladově efektivní a je výrazně lepší v (i) zpracování velkých a hlučných webových dat a (ii) škálování na nové jazyky s nízkými zdroji.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo pristup pripravnosti dokumenta na sadržaju (CDA), efikasan metod za usklađivanje multijezičkih web dokumenta na temelju sadržaja u stvaranju paralelnih podataka obuke za sisteme prevoda mašin a (MT) koji rade na industrijskoj nivou. CDA radi na dva koraka: i) projekcija dokumenta web domena na zajednički multijezički prostor; i poravnati ih na temelju sličnosti predstavljanja njihovih u tom prostoru. Učinimo leksičke modele prevoda za izgradnju predstavljanja vektora koristeći TFIDF. CDA postiže usporednost sa sistemima stanja umjetnosti u WMT-16 Bilingualnom standardu podijeljenih mjera zadataka dok radi u multijezičkom prostoru. Osim toga, stvorili smo dvije mrežne podatke kako bi pregledali robotu CDA u industrijskom postavljanju uključujući do 28 jezika i milijuna dokumenta. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je CDA jačan, koštan učinkovit i značajno superior u procesu velikih i bukovih web podataka i ii) skaliranju na nove i niske resurse jezike.', 'ca': "Introduïm un enfocament basat en Content-based Document Alignment (CDA), un mètode eficient per allinjar documents web multilingües basats en contingut en crear dades paralleles de formació per sistemes de traducció màquina (MT) que funcionen a nivell industrial. CDA treballa en dues etapes: i) projectar documents d'un domini web a un espai multillenguatge compartit; llavors (ii) alliniant-los basant-los en la similitud de les seves representacions en aquest espai. Utilitzem models de traducció lèxica per a construir representacions vectorals fent servir TFIDF. El CDA aconsegueix un rendiment comparable amb els sistemes més avançats de la tasca compartida d'alliniament de documentos bilingües WMT-16 mentre opera en espai multilingüe. A més, vam crear dos conjunts de dades a escala web per examinar la robustet del CDA en un entorn industrial que implicava fins a 28 llengües i milions de documents. Els experiments demostren que el CDA és robust, rentable i significativament superior en (i) processar dades web grans i sorolloses i (ii) escalar a llengües noves i amb baixos recursos.", 'et': 'Tutvustame sisupõhist dokumentide joondamise lähenemisviisi (Content-based Document Alignment, CDA), tõhusat meetodit mitmekeelsete veebidokumentide ühtlustamiseks sisu põhjal, luues paralleelseid koolitusandmeid tööstuslikul tasandil töötavatele masintõlkesüsteemidele. CDA töötab kahes etapis: i) veebidomeeni dokumentide projekteerimine ühisesse mitmekeelsesse ruumi; seejärel (ii) nende ühtlustamine lähtudes nende esituste sarnasusest sellises ruumis. Me kasutame leksikaalseid tõlkemudeleid, et luua vektorrepresentatsioone TFIDF-i abil. CDA saavutab jõudluse, mis on võrreldav WMT-16 kahekeelse dokumendi joondamise jagatud ülesande võrdlusaluse tipptasemel süsteemidega, töötades mitmekeelses ruumis. Lisaks loosime kaks veebimõõtmelist andmekogumit, et uurida CDA tugevust tööstuslikus keskkonnas, mis hõlmab kuni 28 keelt ja miljoneid dokumente. Katsed näitavad, et CDA on tugev, kulutõhus ja oluliselt parem (i) suurte ja mürakate veebiandmete töötlemisel ning (ii) skaleerimisel uutele ja vähese ressursiga keeltele.', 'fi': 'Otamme käyttöön Content-based Document Alignment -lähestymistavan (CDA), joka on tehokas tapa yhdenmukaistaa monikielisiä web-asiakirjoja sisältöön perustuvien rinnakkaisten koulutustietojen luomisessa teollisella tasolla toimiville konekäännösjärjestelmille. CDA toimii kahdessa vaiheessa: i) verkkotunnuksen asiakirjojen projisointi yhteiseen monikieliseen tilaan; sitten (ii) kohdistaa ne niiden esittämien samankaltaisuuden perusteella tällaisessa tilassa. Hyödynnämme leksikaalisia käännösmalleja rakentaaksemme vektoriesityksiä TFIDF:n avulla. CDA saavuttaa suorituskyvyn, joka on verrattavissa WMT-16 kaksikielisen dokumenttien linjauksen jaettujen tehtävien vertailuarvon uusimpiin järjestelmiin, kun se toimii monikielisessä tilassa. Lisäksi loimme kaksi web-mittakaavan datajoukkoa tutkimaan CDA:n kestävyyttä teollisessa ympäristössä, jossa on jopa 28 kieltä ja miljoonia asiakirjoja. Kokeet osoittavat, että CDA on vankka, kustannustehokas ja huomattavasti parempi (i) suuren ja meluisan web-datan käsittelyssä ja (ii) skaalauksessa uusille ja vähän resursseja käyttäville kielille.', 'sk': 'Uvedli smo pristop vsebinskega usklajevanja dokumentov (CDA), učinkovito metodo usklajevanja večjezičnih spletnih dokumentov na podlagi vsebine pri ustvarjanju vzporednih podatkov o usposabljanju za sisteme strojnega prevajanja (MT), ki delujejo na industrijski ravni. CDA deluje v dveh korakih: (i) projekcija dokumentov spletne domene v skupni večjezični prostor; nato (ii) jih uskladiti na podlagi podobnosti njihovih predstavitev v takem prostoru. Izkoriščamo leksikalne prevajalske modele za gradnjo vektorskih predstavitev z uporabo TFIDF. CDA dosega učinkovitost, primerljiva z najsodobnejšimi sistemi v referenčni vrednosti opravil z dvojezično poravnavo dokumentov WMT-16, medtem ko deluje v večjezičnem prostoru. Poleg tega smo ustvarili dve spletni nabori podatkov, da bi preučili robustnost CDA v industrijskem okolju, ki vključuje do 28 jezikov in milijone dokumentov. Poskusi kažejo, da je CDA robustna, stroškovno učinkovita in bistveno boljša pri (i) obdelavi velikih in hrupnih spletnih podatkov ter (ii) prilagajanju novim jezikom z nizkimi viri.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים גישה למסמכים המבוססת בתוכן (CDA), שיטה יעילה כדי להאמין מסמכים אינטרנטים רבים שפויים המבוססים על התוכן לייצור נתונים אימונים מקבילים למערכות התרגום המכונית (MT) שמפעילות ברמה התעשייתית. CDA עובד בשני צעדים: (i) פרוייקציה מסמכים של שטח רשת למרחב רב-שפתי משותף; לאחר מכן (ii) מארגנים אותם בהתבסס על הדמיון של מייצגותיהם בחלל כזה. אנו משתמשים בדוגמנים של תרגום לקסי כדי לבנות מייצגים ווקטורים באמצעות TFIDF. CDA משיג ביצועים שווים עם מערכות מוקדמות במסמך המיוחד WMT-16 במערכת משימה משותפת בהפעלה בחלל רב-שפתי. חוץ מזה, יצרנו שני קבוצות מידע ברשת כדי לבדוק את החזקה של CDA במסגרת תעשיית שמכילה עד 28 שפות ומיליוני מסמכים. הניסויים מראים כי CDA חזק, יעיל עלות, והוא יותר טוב משמעותית ב (i) מעבד נתונים רשתיים גדולים ורעשים ו (ii) מקדים לשפות חדשות ומוצאות נמוכות.', 'ha': "Tuna ƙara wata hanyor Alinci na Takin Takardun Aiki (CDA), wata hanyo mai amfani da za'a haɗa takardar wasu takarda na'urar-mulki, a kan ƙiƙira data da za'a daidaita wa fassarar mutane (MT) na yi aiki a kan zancin da za'a gabatar da shi. CDA yana aiki cikin hanyõyi biyu: (i) mai amfani da takardar kwamfyutan wata na'ura zuwa wani filin mutane da aka raba shi; Sa'an nan ya san su a kan misãlan mutane da ke cikin wannan fili. We leverage lexical translation models to build vector representations using TFIDF.  CDA yana sãmun performance mai daidai da state-of-the-art system in the WMT-16Document Alignition Shared Taurar aiki Babu, ba mu sami tsarin bayani biyu masu tsari a web-shawara dõmin ka jarraba tufãfin CDA a cikin muhalli da ke cikin kassala masu haɗi zuwa 28 harshe da millionnin takardar. Tajarakin na nuna cewa, CDA ana yi riƙo, mai amfani da shi, kuma yana da mafi kyauta cikin (i) aikin data masu girma da saurãre na web da (ii) mai ƙayyade zuwa harshen na yanzu-na-ƙaranci.", 'jv': 'We first met with a Content-bazed document Align method (cdA), an effectual method to align multi-language web documents supported on Content in forming cdA gunakake durung basa: (i) nggawe dokumen web domain sing dikarolan luwih langgar;  Nanging Language cdA kuwi nggawe akeh perusahaan karo state-of-the-arts sistem ning WT-16 Bilingual Dokumen Alialignment Joined tasks bench podho operasi kanggo kelangan anyar luwih-luwih Tanggala, awak dhéwé nggawe éntuk sistem durung datascale web kanggo ujian nggawe kapan sistem sing komplikasi cdA neng sampek manus sing isin akeh gambar tanggal og sampeyan akeh mlayen dokumen Name', 'bo': 'We introduce a Content-based Document Alignment approach (CDA), an efficient method to align multilingual web documents based on content in creating parallel training data for machine translation (MT) systems operating at the industrial level. CDA རྫོགས་གཉིས་ནང་དུ་ལས་སྤྱོད་པ: (i) ཡིག དེ་ནས་དེ་དག་གི་བར་སྟོང་ནང་གི་ངོ་བོའི་མཉམ་དུ་དང་བྲལ་སྒྲིག་བཞིན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་སྐད་རིགས་གཟུགས་འབྲི་བ་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་བཟོ་བྱེད་མཁན་གྱི་བརྗོད་རྟགས་ལ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་བྱེད། CDA achieves performance comparable with state-of-the-art systems in the WMT-16 Bilingual Document Alignment Shared Task benchmark while operating in multilingual space. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ཉུང་སྒྲིག་ཆ་གཉིས་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱས་གོང་སྒྲུབ་གྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ནང་གི་སྒུལ་གཏོང་མཁན་ སྟོབས་ཞུགས་བྱས་ན། CDA ནི་སྟོབས་ཤུགས་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས་ལས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གཙོ་བོ་ཡིན་པས། i།'}
{'en': 'Is Supervised Syntactic Parsing Beneficial for Language Understanding Tasks? An Empirical Investigation', 'ar': 'هل التحليل النحوي الخاضع للإشراف مفيد لمهام فهم اللغة؟ تحقيق تجريبي', 'es': '¿El análisis sintáctico supervisado es beneficioso para las tareas de comprensión del lenguaje? Una investigación empírica', 'fr': "L'analyse syntaxique supervisée est-elle bénéfique pour les tâches de compréhension de la langue\xa0? Une enquête empirique", 'pt': 'A análise sintática supervisionada é benéfica para tarefas de compreensão de linguagem? Uma Investigação Empírica', 'ja': '統括された構文解析は、言語タスクを理解するのに有益ですか？実証的な調査', 'ru': 'Является ли контролируемый синтаксический анализ полезным для задач понимания языка? Эмпирическое исследование', 'zh': '监句法解析有益于言乎? 实按之', 'hi': 'क्या पर्यवेक्षित वाक्यात्मक पार्सिंग भाषा समझने के कार्यों के लिए फायदेमंद है? एक अनुभवजन्य जांच', 'ga': 'An Bhfuil Parsáil Chomhréire Maoirsithe Tairbheach do Thascanna Tuiscint Teanga? Imscrúdú eimpíreach', 'ka': 'სინტექტიკური გადაწყვეტილების გამოსახულებელი ენათების გადასწავლების მოსახულებელია? თმორიკალური ინტერვიზაცია', 'hu': 'A felügyelt szintaktikus értelmezés előnyös-e a nyelvmegértési feladatok számára? Empirikus vizsgálat', 'el': 'Είναι η εποπτευόμενη συντακτική ανάλυση επωφελής για τις εργασίες κατανόησης της γλώσσας; Μια εμπειρική έρευνα', 'it': "L'analisi sintattica supervisionata è vantaggiosa per le attività di comprensione linguistica? Un'indagine empirica", 'lt': 'Ar prižiūrimas sintaktinis analizavimas naudingas kalbos supratimo užduotims? An Empirical Investigation', 'kk': 'Тілді түсіну тапсырмаларының синтактикалық талдау мүмкіндігі бар ма? Эмпериялық зерттеу', 'ms': 'Adakah penghuraian Sintaktik Diperhatikan Beruntung untuk Tugas Pemahaman Bahasa? Sebuah penyelidikan Empirical', 'mk': 'Дали надгледуваното синтактичко анализирање е корисно за задачите за разбирање на јазикот? Империска истрага', 'ml': 'ഭാഷ ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടുന്ന ജോലികള്\u200dക്കായി സംസാരിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന സിന്\u200dടാക്റ്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ക് പാര്\u200d ഒരു എമിരിക്കല്\u200d അന്വേഷണം', 'mt': 'Is-Superviżjoni tal-Analiżi Sintattika Benefiċjarja għal Kompiti ta’ Qbil tal-Lingwi? Investigazzjoni Impirika', 'mn': 'Холбоо ойлгох үйл ажиллагаанд хэрэгцээтэй синтактикийн талаар ажиллаж байгаа юу? Эзэн хааны судалгаа', 'no': 'Er overvakt syntaksisk tolking nyttig for språk forståking oppgåver? Ein empirisk investigasjon', 'pl': 'Czy nadzorowana analiza syntaktyczna jest korzystna dla zadań rozumienia języka? Badanie empiryczne', 'ro': 'Interpretarea sintactică supravegheată este benefică pentru sarcinile de înțelegere a limbilor? O investigaţie empirică', 'sr': 'Da li je nadgledan sintaktički analizač koristan za zadatak razumevanja jezika? Imperijska istraga', 'si': 'භාෂාව තේරුම් ක්\u200dරියාව සඳහා බලන්න සංකේතික විශ්ලේෂණ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තියෙනවද? අධ්\u200dයාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය', 'so': 'Ma faa’iido u leedahay kaalmada baaritaanka Syntactic ee luuqada waxgarashada? Baaritaanka shaqada', 'ta': 'மொழிக்கு புரிந்து கொள்ளும் பணிகளுக்கு சேர்க்கப்பட்ட ஒத்திசைவு பாடல் உதவியாக இருக்கிறதா? Name', 'sv': 'Är övervakad syntaktisk tolkning fördelaktig för språkförståelse uppgifter? En empirisk undersökning', 'ur': 'کیا زبان سمجھنے کے کاموں کے لئے سوپریز سینٹیکسی پارسینگ فائدہ دیتی ہے؟ ایک امپراتیک تحقیق', 'uz': 'Name Name', 'vi': 'Có phải thao tác pháp thuật được giám sát ảnh hưởng cho các nhiệm vụ hiểu biết ngôn ngữ? Điều tra Empirical', 'nl': 'Is supervised syntactic parsing voordelig voor het begrijpen van talen taken? Een empirisch onderzoek', 'da': 'Er overvåget syntaksisk fortolkning gavnlig for sprogforståelsesopgaver? En empirisk undersøgelse', 'bg': 'Полезен ли е надзорният синтактичен анализ за задачите за разбиране на езика? Емпирично проучване', 'id': 'Is Supervised Syntactic Parsing Beneficial for Language Understanding Tasks?  An Empirical Investigation', 'fa': 'آیا تحلیل سنتاکتیک مدیریت برای مطالعه فهمیدن زبان مفید است؟ یک تحقیقات امپراطوری', 'hr': 'Da li je nadzirana sintaktička analiza korisna za zadatke razumijevanja jezika? Empirička istraga', 'sw': 'Je, kazi za Kufahamika kwa Lugha zinazotumiwa na Uunganishaji unasaidia? Tafiti la Utamaduni', 'de': 'Ist Supervised Syntaktic Parsing vorteilhaft fĂ¼r SprachverstĂ¤ndnisaufgaben? Eine empirische Untersuchung', 'sq': 'A është analiza sintaktike e mbikqyrur e dobishme për detyrat e kuptimit të gjuhës? An Empirical Investigation', 'ko': '감독하는 문법 분석이 언어 이해 임무에 유리합니까?실증 조사', 'tr': 'Diller düşünmek üçin gözetlenýän Sintaktik Taýýarlamak kynçylykmy? Ýardimiň görkezilişi', 'af': 'Is Supervised Syntactic Parsing Beneficiale for Language Understanding Tasks? Name', 'az': 'Dil anlama işləri üçün mühafizə edilən Sintaktik Analizi faydalandırılmı? Empirical Investigation', 'bn': 'Is Supervised Syntactic Parsing Beneficial for Language Understanding Tasks?  Name', 'bs': 'Da li je nadzirana sintaktička analiza korisna za posao razumijevanja jezika? Empirička istraga', 'ca': "És l'analisi sintàtica supervisada beneficiosa per a les tasques de comprensió del llenguatge? Una investigació imperial", 'cs': 'Je kontrolovaná syntaktická analýza přínosná pro úkoly porozumění jazykům? Empirické vyšetřování', 'et': 'Kas jälgitav süntaktiline parsimine on keele mõistmise ülesannete jaoks kasulik? Empiiriline uurimine', 'fi': 'Onko valvottu synteettinen analyysi hyödyllinen kielen ymmärtämisen tehtävissä? Empiirinen tutkimus', 'am': 'ለቋንቋ ማስታወቂያው ስራዎችን ለቋንቋ የሚጠቅምበት Syntactic Parsing An Empirical Investigation', 'hy': 'Արդյո՞ք վերահսկված սինտակտիկ վերլուծությունը օգտակար է լեզվի հասկանալու առաջադրանքների համար: Իմպերիկական հետազոտություն', 'jv': 'yes politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': '@ action KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Ali je nadzorovano sintaktično razčlenjanje koristno za naloge razumevanja jezika? Empirična preiskava', 'bo': 'ལྟ་རྟོག་ཅན་གྱི་སྟངས་འཛིན་གྱི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་ནུས་ཅན་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་བསམ་ཞིབ་', 'he': 'האם מבחן סינטקטי מושלם מועיל למשימות הבנה לשפה? חקירה אימפרית'}
{'en': 'Traditional NLP has long held (supervised) syntactic parsing necessary for successful higher-level semantic language understanding (LU). The recent advent of end-to-end neural models, self-supervised via language modeling (LM), and their success on a wide range of LU tasks, however, questions this belief. In this work, we empirically investigate the usefulness of supervised parsing for semantic LU in the context of LM-pretrained transformer networks. Relying on the established fine-tuning paradigm, we first couple a pretrained transformer with a biaffine parsing head, aiming to infuse explicit syntactic knowledge from Universal Dependencies treebanks into the transformer. We then fine-tune the model for LU tasks and measure the effect of the intermediate parsing training (IPT) on downstream LU task performance. Results from both monolingual English and zero-shot language transfer experiments (with intermediate target-language parsing) show that explicit formalized syntax, injected into transformers through IPT, has very limited and inconsistent effect on downstream LU performance. Our results, coupled with our analysis of transformers’ representation spaces before and after intermediate parsing, make a significant step towards providing answers to an essential question : how (un)availing is supervised parsing for high-level semantic natural language understanding in the era of large neural models?', 'ar': 'لطالما أجرت البرمجة اللغوية العصبية التقليدية (تحت الإشراف) التحليل النحوي الضروري لنجاح فهم اللغة الدلالي عالي المستوى (LU). ومع ذلك ، فإن ظهور النماذج العصبية الشاملة التي يتم الإشراف عليها ذاتيًا عبر نمذجة اللغة (LM) ونجاحها في مجموعة واسعة من مهام LU يشكك في هذا الاعتقاد. في هذا العمل ، نحقق بشكل تجريبي في فائدة التحليل الخاضع للإشراف لـ LU الدلالي في سياق شبكات المحولات LM سابقة التدريب. بالاعتماد على نموذج الضبط الدقيق الراسخ ، قمنا أولاً بإقران محول مُدرب مسبقًا برأس تحليل بيافين ، بهدف غرس معرفة نحوية صريحة من بنوك شجرة التبعيات العالمية في المحول. نقوم بعد ذلك بضبط نموذج مهام LU وقياس تأثير تدريب التحليل الوسيط (IPT) على أداء مهمة LU المصب. تظهر النتائج من تجارب نقل اللغة الإنجليزية أحادية اللغة وتجارب نقل اللغة بدون طلقة (مع التحليل المتوسط للغة الهدف) أن بناء الجملة الرسمي الصريح ، المحقون في المحولات من خلال IPT ، له تأثير محدود للغاية وغير متسق على أداء LU المصب. نتائجنا ، إلى جانب تحليلنا لمساحات تمثيل المحولات قبل وبعد التحليل الوسيط ، تشكل خطوة مهمة نحو تقديم إجابات لسؤال أساسي: كيف (عدم) يتم الإشراف على التحليل من أجل فهم اللغة الطبيعية الدلالي عالي المستوى في عصر نماذج عصبية كبيرة؟', 'pt': 'A PNL tradicional há muito tempo mantém (supervisionado) a análise sintática necessária para a compreensão de linguagem semântica (LU) de alto nível bem-sucedida. O recente advento de modelos neurais de ponta a ponta, auto-supervisionados por meio de modelagem de linguagem (LM), e seu sucesso em uma ampla gama de tarefas de LU, no entanto, questionam essa crença. Neste trabalho, investigamos empiricamente a utilidade da análise sintática supervisionada para LU semântica no contexto de redes de transformadores pré-treinados em LM. Baseando-se no paradigma de ajuste fino estabelecido, primeiro acoplamos um transformador pré-treinado com uma cabeça de análise biffine, com o objetivo de infundir conhecimento sintático explícito dos bancos de árvore de Dependências Universais no transformador. Em seguida, ajustamos o modelo para tarefas de LU e medimos o efeito do treinamento de análise intermediária (IPT) no desempenho da tarefa de LU a jusante. Os resultados dos experimentos de transferência de inglês monolíngue e de idioma zero-shot (com análise intermediária de idioma de destino) mostram que a sintaxe formalizada explícita, injetada em transformadores por meio de IPT, tem um efeito muito limitado e inconsistente no desempenho da LU downstream. Nossos resultados, juntamente com nossa análise dos espaços de representação dos transformadores antes e depois da análise intermediária, dão um passo significativo para fornecer respostas a uma questão essencial: como (in)aproveitar é a análise supervisionada para compreensão de linguagem natural semântica de alto nível na era da grandes modelos neurais?', 'es': 'La PNL tradicional ha mantenido durante mucho tiempo el análisis sintáctico (supervisado) necesario para una comprensión del lenguaje semántico (LU) de alto nivel. Sin embargo, la reciente aparición de modelos neuronales de extremo a extremo, autosupervisados a través del modelado del lenguaje (LM), y su éxito en una amplia gama de tareas de LU, cuestionan esta creencia. En este trabajo, investigamos empíricamente la utilidad del análisis supervisado para LU semántica en el contexto de redes de transformadores preentrenados con LM. Confiando en el paradigma de ajuste fino establecido, primero acoplamos un transformador preentrenado con un cabezal de análisis biafín, con el objetivo de infundir conocimiento sintáctico explícito de los bancos de árboles de Dependencias Universales en el transformador. A continuación, ajustamos el modelo para las tareas de LU y medimos el efecto del entrenamiento de análisis intermedio (IPT) en el rendimiento de las tareas de LU descendentes. Los resultados de los experimentos de inglés monolingüe y transferencia de idioma cero (con análisis intermedio del idioma objetivo) muestran que la sintaxis formalizada explícita, inyectada en los transformadores a través de IPT, tiene un efecto muy limitado e inconsistente en el rendimiento de LU descendente. Nuestros resultados, junto con nuestro análisis de los espacios de representación de los transformadores antes y después del análisis intermedio, dan un paso significativo para proporcionar respuestas a una pregunta esencial: cómo se (in) aprovecha el análisis supervisado para la comprensión del lenguaje natural semántico de alto nivel en la era de los grandes neuronales modelos?', 'fr': "La PNL traditionnelle gère depuis longtemps l'analyse syntaxique (supervisée) nécessaire pour une compréhension réussie du langage sémantique (LU) de haut niveau. L'avènement récent de modèles neuronaux de bout en bout, auto-supervisés via la modélisation du langage (LM), et leur succès sur un large éventail de tâches LU, remettent toutefois en question cette croyance. Dans ce travail, nous étudions empiriquement l'utilité de l'analyse supervisée pour la LU sémantique dans le contexte de réseaux de transformateurs préformés LM. En nous appuyant sur le paradigme de réglage fin établi, nous couplons d'abord un transformateur préentraîné à une tête d'analyse biaffine, dans le but d'insuffler au transformateur des connaissances syntaxiques explicites provenant des banques d'arbres des dépendances universelles. Nous affinons ensuite le modèle pour les tâches LU et mesurons l'effet de l'entraînement d'analyse intermédiaire (IPT) sur les performances des tâches LU en aval. Les résultats d'expériences monolingues en anglais et de transfert de langue zero-shot (avec analyse intermédiaire en langage cible) montrent que la syntaxe formalisée explicite, injectée dans les transformateurs via IPT, a un effet très limité et incohérent sur les performances des LU en aval. Nos résultats, associés à notre analyse des espaces de représentation des transformateurs avant et après l'analyse intermédiaire, constituent un pas important vers la fourniture de réponses à une question essentielle\xa0: comment (ou non) utiliser l'analyse supervisée pour une compréhension sémantique du langage naturel de haut niveau à l'ère des grands neurones des modèles\xa0?", 'zh': '古NLP久持(督)句法解析,此成功更高层次语义语(LU)所须也。 然近以言建模(LM)自督之端神经见,及其成功于广LU,皆疑之矣。 以此观之,考LM预练变压器网络上下文语义LU监解析之有用性。 据已建之微,先将预练转换器与双歧因解析头相合,指将通用树库显式语法知识注入转换器中。 然后调 LU 其形,而度其中解析练 (IPT) LU 下流之性。 单语英语与零言语转实验(用中间语言解析)之的结果表明,因IPT注转换器者显式形式化语法下流LU性甚有限而不同。 加之以解析后之转换器,向之以要,大神经之世,监解析何以(不)于高语义自然语言?', 'ja': '従来のNLPは、より高レベルの意味論的言語理解（ LU ）を成功させるために必要な構文解析を長い間保持（監督）してきた。 しかしながら、言語モデリング（ LM ）を介して自己監督されたエンドツーエンドのニューラルモデルの最近の出現と、幅広いLUタスクでの成功は、この信念を疑問視している。 この研究では、LM事前に訓練された変圧器ネットワークの文脈で、セマンティックLUのための監視された構文解析の有用性を実証的に調査します。 確立された微調整パラダイムに依存して、私たちは最初に、ユニバーサル依存性ツリーバンクからの明示的な構文知識を変圧器に注入することを目指して、バイアフィン構文解析ヘッドを備えた事前に訓練された変圧器をカップリングしました。 次に、LUタスクのモデルを微調整し、中間解析トレーニング（ IPT ）が下流のLUタスクのパフォーマンスに与える影響を測定します。 単一言語の英語とゼロショット言語の両方の転送実験（中間ターゲット言語の構文解析を伴う）の結果は、IPTを介して変圧器に注入された明示的な形式化された構文が、下流のLUパフォーマンスに非常に限定的で一貫性のない影響を与えることを示しています。 私たちの結果は、中間解析の前後の変圧器の表現空間の分析と相まって、大規模なニューラルモデルの時代において、高水準の意味論的自然言語理解のためにどのように監視された構文解析を利用するかという本質的な質問への答えを提供するために重要なステップを踏んでいます。', 'ru': 'Традиционный NLP уже давно проводит (контролируемый) синтаксический синтаксический анализ, необходимый для успешного понимания семантического языка (LU) более высокого уровня. Однако недавнее появление сквозных нейронных моделей, самоконтролируемых посредством языкового моделирования (LM), и их успех в широком спектре задач LU ставит под сомнение эту веру. В этой работе мы эмпирически исследуем полезность контролируемого синтаксического анализа для семантического LU в контексте предварительно обученных LM-трансформаторных сетей. Опираясь на установившуюся парадигму тонкой настройки, мы сначала объединили предварительно обученный трансформатор с биаффиновой синтаксической головкой, стремясь внедрить в трансформатор явные синтаксические знания из блоков деревьев универсальных зависимостей. Затем мы тонко настраиваем модель для задач LU и измеряем влияние промежуточного обучения синтаксическому анализу (IPT) на выполнение задач ниже по потоку LU. Результаты экспериментов по одноязычной передаче английского языка и языка с нулевым выстрелом (с промежуточным разбором языка-мишени) показывают, что явный формализованный синтаксис, введенный в трансформаторы через IPT, оказывает очень ограниченное и непоследовательное влияние на производительность LU ниже по потоку. Наши результаты, в сочетании с нашим анализом пространств представления трансформаторов до и после промежуточного синтаксического анализа, делают значительный шаг к предоставлению ответов на существенный вопрос: как (не) использовать контролируемый синтаксический анализ для понимания семантического естественного языка высокого уровня в эпоху больших нейронных моделей?', 'hi': 'पारंपरिक एनएलपी ने लंबे समय से सफल उच्च-स्तरीय शब्दार्थ भाषा समझ (एलयू) के लिए आवश्यक वाक्यात्मक पार्सिंग (पर्यवेक्षित) आयोजित किया है। एंड-टू-एंड न्यूरल मॉडल के हालिया आगमन, भाषा मॉडलिंग (एलएम) के माध्यम से आत्म-पर्यवेक्षण, और एलयू कार्यों की एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला पर उनकी सफलता, हालांकि, इस विश्वास पर सवाल उठाती है। इस काम में, हम अनुभवजन्य रूप से एलएम-प्रीट्रेन्ड ट्रांसफॉर्मर नेटवर्क के संदर्भ में शब्दार्थ एलयू के लिए पर्यवेक्षित पार्सिंग की उपयोगिता की जांच करते हैं। स्थापित ठीक ट्यूनिंग प्रतिमान पर भरोसा करते हुए, हम पहले एक biaffine पार्सिंग सिर के साथ एक pretrained ट्रांसफार्मर जोड़ा, यूनिवर्सल निर्भरता treebanks से स्पष्ट वाक्यात्मक ज्ञान को ट्रांसफॉर्मर में infuse करने के उद्देश्य से. फिर हम एलयू कार्यों के लिए मॉडल को ठीक करते हैं और डाउनस्ट्रीम एलयू कार्य प्रदर्शन पर मध्यवर्ती पार्सिंग प्रशिक्षण (आईपीटी) के प्रभाव को मापते हैं। मोनोलिंगुअल अंग्रेजी और शून्य-शॉट भाषा हस्तांतरण प्रयोगों (मध्यवर्ती लक्ष्य-भाषा पार्सिंग के साथ) दोनों के परिणामों से पता चलता है कि स्पष्ट औपचारिक वाक्यविन्यास, आईपीटी के माध्यम से ट्रांसफार्मर में इंजेक्ट किया गया, डाउनस्ट्रीम एलयू प्रदर्शन पर बहुत सीमित और असंगत प्रभाव पड़ता है। हमारे परिणाम, मध्यवर्ती पार्सिंग से पहले और बाद में ट्रांसफॉर्मर के प्रतिनिधित्व रिक्त स्थान के हमारे विश्लेषण के साथ युग्मित, एक आवश्यक प्रश्न का उत्तर प्रदान करने की दिशा में एक महत्वपूर्ण कदम उठाते हैं: बड़े तंत्रिका मॉडल के युग में उच्च-स्तरीय शब्दार्थ प्राकृतिक भाषा की समझ के लिए (संयुक्त राष्ट्र) का लाभ कैसे पर्यवेक्षित किया जाता है?', 'ga': 'Tá parsáil chomhréire (faoi mhaoirseacht) ag NLP traidisiúnta le fada an lá atá riachtanach chun tuiscint rathúil ardleibhéil ar theanga shéimeantach (LU). Ceistíonn teacht na múnlaí néarúla ceann go ceann le déanaí, iad féin-mhaoirsithe trí shamhaltú teanga (LM), agus an rath a bhí orthu ar raon leathan de thascanna LU an creideamh seo, áfach. San obair seo, déanaimid imscrúdú go heimpíreach ar a n-úsáidí atá parsáil faoi mhaoirseacht le haghaidh LU shéimeantach i gcomhthéacs líonraí trasfhoirmeoirí réamhoilte LM. Ag brath ar an bparaidím mionchoigeartaithe seanbhunaithe, cuirimid le chéile claochladán réamhoilte le ceann parsála biaifín ar dtús, agus é mar aidhm aige eolas sainráite comhréire ó bhainc crann Spleáchas Uilíoch a insileadh isteach sa chlaochladán. Déanaimid mionchoigeartú ansin ar an tsamhail le haghaidh tascanna LU agus tomhaisimid éifeacht na hoiliúna parsála idirmheánacha (IPT) ar fheidhmíocht tascanna LU iartheachtacha. Léiríonn torthaí ó thurgnaimh aistrithe teanga aonteangacha Béarla agus náid (le parsáil sprioctheanga idirmheánach) go bhfuil éifeacht an-teoranta agus neamh-chomhsheasmhach ag comhréir fhoirmiúil shainráite, a instealladh isteach i gclaochladáin trí IPT, ar fheidhmíocht LU iartheachtacha. Déanann ár dtorthaí, in éineacht lenár n-anailís ar spásanna ionadaíochta claochladáin roimh pharsáil idirmheánach agus ina dhiaidh, céim shuntasach i dtreo freagraí a sholáthar ar cheist riachtanach: conas (neamh)úsáid a bhaint as parsáil maoirsithe le haghaidh tuiscint ardleibhéil shéimeantach teanga nádúrtha i ré na samhlacha néaracha móra?', 'ka': 'Name საბოლოო დასასრულებელი ნეიროლური მოდელების შესახებ, თავიდან მუშაობელი ენის მოდელებით (LM) და მათი წარმატები უფრო დიდი LU დავალების განმავლობაში, მაგრამ ამ წარმატების შესახებ ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ემპერიკურად განსხვავებთ სემონტიკური LU-ს სემონტიკური ტრანფორმეტრის ქსელების კონტექსტექტის გამოყენებელობას. ჩვენ პირველად გავაკეთებთ ბიფინის პარადიგმის შესახებ, რომელიც უნდა გავაკეთებთ სინტექტიკური ცოცხლის შესახებ სამყარო განსახებებიდან ტრანფორმაციაში. შემდეგ ჩვენ მუშაობით LU დავალების მოდელს და განზომილებით განზომილების ეფექტის განზომილება (IPT) LU დამუშაობაზე. მონოლენგური ანგლისური და ნულ სტრიქტური ენის გადატანსტის ექსპერიმენტების შედეგი გამოჩვენება, რომ განსხვავებული ფორმალური სინტაქსი, რომელიც IPT-ის გამოყენებული ტრანფორმენტებში იქნება მნიშვნელოვანი და არა ჩვენი წარმოდგენები, რომელიც ჩვენი ტრანფორმენტების გამოსახულებების განსახულებების განსახულებების განსახულებების ანალიზაციით წინ და განსახულებების განსახულებების შემდეგ გავაკეთოთ მნიშვნელოვანი წარმოდგენების განსახულებას: როგორ (un)', 'hu': 'A hagyományos NLP régóta tartja fenn (felügyelt) a sikeres magasabb szintű szemantikai nyelv megértéséhez szükséges szintaktikus elemzést. A nyelvmodellezés (LM) segítségével önfelügyelt end-to-end neurális modellek közelmúltbeli megjelenése és sikereik számos LU feladatban azonban megkérdőjelezik ezt a meggyőződést. Ebben a munkában empirikusan vizsgáljuk a felügyelt elemzés hasznosságát a szemantikus LU esetében LM-előképzett transzformátorhálózatok kontextusában. A megalapozott finomhangolási paradigmára támaszkodva először egy előkészített transzformátort párosítunk biaffin elemzőfejjel, azzal a céllal, hogy explicit szintaktikus ismereteket juttassunk át a transzformátorba. Ezt követően finomhangoljuk a LU feladatok modelljét, és mérjük a közbenső elemzési képzés (IPT) hatását a LU feladatok teljesítményére. Mind az egynyelvű angol, mind a zero-shot nyelvátviteli kísérletek eredményei (közbenső célnyelvi elemzéssel) azt mutatják, hogy a transzformátorokba fecskendezett explicit formalizált szintaxis nagyon korlátozott és következetlen hatással van a downstream LU teljesítményére. Eredményeink, valamint a transzformátorok reprezentációs tereinek elemzésével a közbenső elemzés előtt és után jelentős lépést tesznek egy alapvető kérdésre adott válasz felé: hogyan (ne)hasznosítják a felügyeletet a nagy neurális modellek korszakában a természetes nyelv magas szintű szemantikai megértéséhez?', 'el': 'Η παραδοσιακή ανάλυση έχει εδώ και καιρό διενεργήσει (εποπτευόμενη) σύνταξη απαραίτητη για την επιτυχή κατανόηση σημασιολογικών γλωσσών ανώτερου επιπέδου. Ωστόσο, η πρόσφατη έλευση των ολοκληρωμένων νευρωνικών μοντέλων, αυτοεποπτευόμενων μέσω γλωσσικής μοντελοποίησης (LM), και η επιτυχία τους σε ένα ευρύ φάσμα εργασιών της LU αμφισβητεί αυτή την πεποίθηση. Στην παρούσα εργασία, διερευνούμε εμπειρικά τη χρησιμότητα της εποπτευόμενης ανάλυσης για σημασιολογική Λ.Ε. στο πλαίσιο των προ-εκπαιδευμένων δικτύων μετασχηματιστών. Βασιζόμενοι στο καθιερωμένο πρότυπο λεπτής ρύθμισης, πρώτα συνδυάζουμε έναν προκαθορισμένο μετασχηματιστή με μια κεφαλή ανάλυσης biaffine, με στόχο να εισάγουμε ρητές συντακτικές γνώσεις από τις βάσεις δέντρων των Οικουμενικών Εξαρτήσεων στον μετασχηματιστή. Στη συνέχεια, συντονίζουμε το μοντέλο για τις εργασίες και μετράμε την επίδραση της εκπαίδευσης ενδιάμεσης ανάλυσης (IPT) στην απόδοση της εργασίας μεταγενέστερης ροής. Τα αποτελέσματα τόσο των μονογλωσσών αγγλικών όσο και των πειραμάτων μεταφοράς γλωσσών μηδενικού πυροβολισμού (με ενδιάμεση ανάλυση γλώσσας-στόχου) δείχνουν ότι η ρητή φορμαλισμένη σύνταξη, η οποία εγχέεται στους μετασχηματιστές μέσω IPT, έχει πολύ περιορισμένη και ασυνεπή επίδραση στην απόδοση των μεταγενέστερων LU. Τα αποτελέσματά μας, σε συνδυασμό με την ανάλυση των χώρων αναπαράστασης των μετασχηματιστών πριν και μετά την ενδιάμεση ανάλυση, κάνουν ένα σημαντικό βήμα προς την παροχή απαντήσεων σε ένα βασικό ερώτημα: πώς (μη)αξιοποίηση είναι η επιτηρημένη ανάλυση για την κατανόηση σημασιολογικής φυσικής γλώσσας υψηλού επιπέδου στην εποχή των μεγάλων νευρωνικών μοντέλων;', 'it': "L'NLP tradizionale ha a lungo mantenuto (supervisionato) l'analisi sintattica necessaria per la comprensione semantica del linguaggio di livello superiore (LU). Il recente avvento di modelli neurali end-to-end, auto-supervisionati tramite la modellazione del linguaggio (LM), e il loro successo su una vasta gamma di compiti LU, tuttavia, mette in discussione questa convinzione. In questo lavoro, esaminiamo empiricamente l'utilità del parsing supervisionato per LU semantica nel contesto delle reti di trasformatori pre-addestrate LM. Basandoci sul paradigma di messa a punto stabilito, accoppiamo prima un trasformatore pretrained con una testa di analisi biaffina, con l'obiettivo di infondere nel trasformatore una conoscenza sintattica esplicita dai banchi degli alberi delle dipendenze universali. Successivamente perfezioniamo il modello per le attività LU e misuriamo l'effetto della formazione di analisi intermedia (IPT) sulle prestazioni delle attività LU a valle. I risultati di entrambi gli esperimenti monolingue inglese e zero-shot language transfer (con analisi intermedia della lingua target) mostrano che la sintassi formalizzata esplicita, iniettata nei trasformatori attraverso IPT, ha un effetto molto limitato e incoerente sulle prestazioni di LU a valle. I nostri risultati, uniti alla nostra analisi degli spazi di rappresentazione dei trasformatori prima e dopo il parsing intermedio, fanno un passo significativo verso la risposta a una domanda essenziale: come (un)availaging è supervisionato il parsing per la comprensione semantica del linguaggio naturale di alto livello nell'era dei grandi modelli neurali?", 'lt': 'Tradicinis NLP jau seniai atliko (prižiūrimą) sintaksinį analizavimą, būtiną sėkmingam aukštesnio lygio semantiniam kalbų supratimui (LU). Vis dėlto neseniai atsirado galutinių nervų modelių, kuriuos prižiūri kalbų modeliavimas (LM), ir jų sėkmė įvairiose LU užduotyse abejoja šiuo įsitikinimu. Šiame darbe empiriniu būdu tiriame, ar naudinga atlikti kontroliuojamą semantinio LU analizę LM iš anksto apmokytų transformatorių tinklų kontekste. Atsižvelgdami į nustatytą patobulinimo paradigm ą, mes pirmą kartą paruošime iš anksto apmokytą transformatorių su biffino analizuojančia galva, siekdami į transformatorių įdėti aiškias sintaktines žinias iš Universal Dependencies medžių bankų. Tuomet tiksliname LU užduočių model į ir išmatuojame tarpinio analizavimo mokymo (IPT) poveikį tolesniam LU užduočių vykdymui. Vienkalbinių anglų ir nulinės nuotraukos kalbos perdavimo eksperimentų (atliekant tarpinį tikslinės kalbos analizavimą) rezultatai rodo, kad aiški formalizuota sintaksija, sušvirkšta į transformatorius per IPT, turi labai nedidelį ir nenuoseklų poveikį tolesniam LU veikimui. Mūsų rezultatai, kartu su mūsų analize apie transformatorių atstovavimo vietas prieš ir po tarpinio analizavimo, daro reikšmingą žingsnį siekiant pateikti atsakymus į esminį klausimą: kaip kontroliuojamas analizavimas siekiant aukšto lygio semantinio natūralios kalbos supratimo didelių nervinių modelių era?', 'mk': 'Традиционалната НЛП долго време одржа (надгледувана) синтактичка анализа потребна за успешно разбирање на семантичниот јазик на повисоко ниво (ЛУ). Неодамнешното пристигнување на нервните модели од крај до крај, самонадгледувани преку јазичното моделирање (LM), и нивниот успех во широк опсег на задачи на LU, сепак, го сомнева ова верување. Во оваа работа, емпирички ја истражуваме корисноста на надгледуваното анализирање за семантична ЛУ во контекст на претренираните трансформаторски мрежи на ЛМ. Врзувајќи се на поставениот парадигм за финетизирање, прво ќе париме претрениран трансформатор со биафинска глава за анализирање, со цел да инфузираме експлицитно синтактичко знаење од дрвјата на универзалните зависности во трансформаторот. Потоа ќе го пофинираме моделот за задачите на ЛУ и ќе го мериме ефектот на меѓувремената обука за анализирање (ИПТ) на понатамошната извршност на задачите на ЛУ. Резултатите од монојазичните експерименти за пренесување на англиски јазик и со нула снимка (со меѓувремено анализирање на јазикот на метата) покажуваат дека експлицитната формализирана синтакса, инјектирана во трансформатори преку ИПТ, има многу ограничен и нескоинзистентен ефект на Нашите резултати, заедно со нашата анализа на местата за претставување на трансформаторите пред и по меѓувреме анализирање, прават значителен чекор кон обезбедувањето одговори на суштинско прашање: како (не)користењето е надгледувано анализирање за семантично разбирање на високо ниво на природниот јазик во ерата на големите нервни', 'ms': 'NLP tradisional telah lama memegang penghuraian sintaktik (mengawasi) yang diperlukan untuk pemahaman bahasa semantik tinggi (LU) yang berjaya. Kehadiran baru-baru ini model saraf akhir-akhir, mengawasi diri melalui model bahasa (LM), dan keberhasilan mereka dalam julat luas tugas LU, bagaimanapun, menanyakan keyakinan ini. Dalam kerja ini, kami secara empirik menyelidiki kebaikan penghuraian yang diawasi untuk LU semantik dalam konteks rangkaian pengubah LM yang dilatih dahulu. Bergantung pada paradigm a penyesuaian yang telah ditetapkan, kita pertama pasang pengubah yang dilatih sebelum dilatih dengan kepala penghurai biaffin, bertujuan untuk menginfusion pengetahuan sintaktik eksplicit dari pangkat pohon Universal Dependencies ke dalam pengubah. Kemudian kita menyesuaikan model untuk tugas LU dan mengukur kesan latihan penghuraian sementara (IPT) pada prestasi tugas LU turun. Hasil dari percubaan pemindahan bahasa bahasa bahasa bahasa satu bahasa dan 0-shot percubaan (dengan penghuraian bahasa-sasaran sementara) menunjukkan bahawa sintaks formalisasi eksplicit, disuntik ke dalam pengubah melalui IPT, mempunyai kesan yang sangat terhad dan tidak konsisten pada prestasi LU turun. Hasil kita, bersama dengan analisis ruang perwakilan pengubah sebelum dan selepas penghuraian sementara, membuat langkah yang signifikan untuk memberikan jawapan kepada soalan penting: bagaimana (un)penggunaan diawasi penghuraian untuk pemahaman bahasa alam semantik tinggi dalam era model saraf besar?', 'ml': 'പാര്\u200dട്ടികമായ NLP നീണ്ടുപോയി (നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ടു) വിജയിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നതിന് ആവശ്യമുള്ള സിന്\u200dടാക് അവസാനം അവസാനിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡലുകളുടെ അടുത്ത അവസാനത്തെ സ്വയം നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ടു, ഭാഷ മോഡലിംഗിലൂടെ അവരുടെ വിജയം വിശിഷ്ടമ ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ശാസ്ത്രീകരമായി അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നത് എംഎം-പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ നെറ്റ്റര്\u200dമാര്\u200dക സ്ഥാപിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന സുന്ദരിതമായ പാര്\u200dഡിഡിമിനെക്കുറിച്ച് നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം ഒരു ബിഫിന്\u200d പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് തലയുമായി മാറ്റുന്നത് രണ്ട് പേരുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. അത പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d ലൂ ജോലികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള മാതൃകയെ നന്നായി നിര്\u200dണയിക്കുകയും തമ്മിലുള്ള പാര്\u200dസിംഗ് പരിശീലനത്തിന്\u200dറെ (ഐപിടി) പ് ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d നിന്നും പൂജ്യത്തിലെ ഭാഷ മാറ്റുന്ന പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d, മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ സ്ഥലങ്ങള്\u200d മുമ്പും മുമ്പും ഇടയിലുള്ള പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങിന് ശേഷം നമ്മുടെ പരിശോധനത്തില്\u200d ഇണക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ചോദ്യത്', 'mt': "NLP tradizzjonali ilha għaddejja minn analiżi sintattika (superviża) meħtieġa għal fehim semantiku ta’ livell ogħla (LU) b’suċċess. L-avveniment reċenti ta’ mudelli newrali minn tarf sa tarf, awtosorveljati permezz ta’ mudell lingwistiku (LM), u s-suċċess tagħhom fuq firxa wiesgħa ta’ kompiti ta’ LU, madankollu, jistaqsi din it-twemmin. In this work, we empirically investigate the usefulness of supervised parsing for semantic LU in the context of LM-pretrained transformer networks.  Abbażi tal-paradigm a stabbilita ta’ rfinar, l-ewwel a ħna nżewġu trasformatur imħarreġ minn qabel b’ras tal-analizzazzjoni biffina, bil-għan li ninfurzaw għarfien sintattiku espliċitu mill-banek tas-siġar tad-Dipendenzi Universali fit-trasformatur. Imbagħad aħna nirranġaw il-mudell għall-kompiti tal-LU u nqisu l-effett tat-taħriġ intermedju tal-analizzazzjoni (IPT) fuq il-prestazzjoni tal-kompiti tal-LU downstream. Results from both monolingual English and zero-shot language transfer experiments (with intermediate target-language parsing) show that explicit formalized syntax, injected into transformers through IPT, has very limited and inconsistent effect on downstream LU performance.  Our results, coupled with our analysis of transformers' representation spaces before and after intermediate parsing, make a significant step towards providing answers to an essential question: how (un)availing is supervised parsing for high-level semantic natural language understanding in the era of large neural models?", 'mn': 'Уламжлалтай NLP нь өндөр түвшингийн semantic хэл ойлголтын тулд хэрэгтэй синтактикийн хуваалцаа (LU) урт хугацаанд байдаг. Сүүлийн үеийн мэдрэлийн загваруудын төгсгөл ирээд хэл загваруудын (LM) аргаар өөрийгөө удирдаж, тэдний амжилтыг олон олон ЛU ажил дээр асуудаг. Энэ ажлын тулд бид LM-ийн шилжүүлэгчийн сүлжээний нөхцөлд хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдсөн LU-г ажиллах хэрэгтэй талаар судалж байна. Эхлээд бид хамгийн түгээмэл парадигмын тухай холбоотой. Бид хамгийн эхлээд биефин хуваалцах толгойгоо хуваалцах шинжлэх ухааны тулд ертөнцийн хамааралтай хамааралтай мэдлэг шинжлэх ухаанаас шинжлэх ухаанаас өөрчлөгч болно. Ингээд бид LU ажлын загварын загварыг тодорхойлож, LU ажлын үйлдвэрлэлд дундаж ажиллах сургалтын (IPT) үр дүнг хэмжээгээр тодорхойлдог. Хоёр нэг хэл Англи хэл болон тэр хэл шилжүүлэх туршилтын үр дүнг (дундаж зорилготой хэл шинжилгээ) нь тодорхой тодорхой тодорхой тодорхой тодорхой синтаксис, IPT руу шилжүүлэгч болгон шилжүүлэгч болгон, LU давхар үйлдэл дээр маш хязгаа Бидний үр дүнд, өөрчлөгчийн үзүүлэлтийн орон зайг өмнө болон дундаж судалгааны дараа бидний шинжилгээнд хамтдаа чухал асуултын хариултыг өгөх нь чухал алхам болгож байна: хэрхэн (un)ашиглах нь өндөр түвшинд ихэвчлэн байгалийн хэл ойлголтын тулд хамгийн их хэмжээний мэдрэ', 'no': 'Name Den siste utviklinga av sluttmodular, selv oversikt via språk modellering (LM), og sine suksess på eit stor rekke av LU-oppgåver spør imidlertid denne troten. I denne arbeida undersøker vi empirisk nødvendigheten for oversikt tolking for semantisk LU i konteksten av LM-transformeringsnettverk. I tillegg til den fastleggte paradigmen, må vi først pare ein pretrende transformasjon med ein biaffin-tolking hode, med mål til å infusera eksplisitt syntaksisk kunnskap frå universelle avhengighetstrykk til transformasjonen. Vi finn derfor modellen for LU-oppgåver og måler effekten av mellombels tolking (IPT) på nedstrekke LU-oppgåver. Resultatet frå begge monolinguiske språk-overføringspråk og 0-shot-språk-eksperimenter (med mellom målspråk-tolking) viser at eksplisitt formalisert syntaks, injisert til transformerande gjennom IPT, har svært begrenset og inkonsistent effekt på nedtrekksfunksjonen av LU. Resultatet våre, saman med analysen våre av omformingsmellomrom før og etter mellombels tolking, gjer ein signifikant steg mot å gjera svar til ein viktig spørsmål: korleis (un) tilgjengeleg er oversikt over tolking for høg nivå semantisk naturspråk forståking i perioden av store neuralmodeller?', 'ro': 'PNL tradițional a ținut mult timp (supravegheat) parsarea sintactică necesară pentru înțelegerea limbajului semantic de nivel superior (LU). Apariția recentă a modelelor neurale end-to-end, auto-supravegheate prin modelarea limbajului (LM), și succesul lor într-o gamă largă de sarcini LU, totuși, pune sub semnul întrebării această credință. În această lucrare, investigăm empiric utilitatea analizării supravegheate pentru LU semantică în contextul rețelelor de transformare pre-instruite LM. Bazându-ne pe paradigma stabilită de reglare fină, mai întâi cuplăm un transformator pre-pregătit cu un cap de analizare biafină, cu scopul de a infuza în transformator cunoștințe sintactice explicite din băncile copace ale Dependențelor Universale. Apoi ajustăm modelul pentru sarcinile LU și măsurăm efectul instruirii intermediare de analiză (IPT) asupra performanței activităților LU din aval. Rezultatele atât ale experimentelor monolingve în limba engleză, cât și ale experimentelor de transfer al limbii zero-shot (cu analizare intermediară a limbii țintă) arată că sintaxa formalizată explicită, injectată în transformatoare prin IPT, are un efect foarte limitat și inconsecvent asupra performanțelor LU din aval. Rezultatele noastre, împreună cu analiza spațiilor de reprezentare ale transformatorilor înainte și după analiza intermediară, fac un pas semnificativ către furnizarea de răspunsuri la o întrebare esențială: cum (ne)utilizarea este supravegheată analizarea pentru înțelegerea limbajului natural semantic la nivel înalt în era modelelor neuronale mari?', 'pl': 'Tradycyjny NLP od dawna prowadzi (nadzorowane) parsowanie składni niezbędne do skutecznego zrozumienia języka semantycznego na wyższym poziomie (LU). Niedawne pojawienie się kompleksowych modeli neuronowych, samodzielnie nadzorowanych poprzez modelowanie językowe (LM) i ich sukces w szerokim zakresie zadań LU kwestionuje jednak to przekonanie. W niniejszej pracy empirycznie badamy przydatność nadzorowanego parsowania dla semantycznych LU w kontekście wstępnie trenowanych sieci transformatorowych LM. Opierając się na ustalonym paradygmacie dostrajania, najpierw połączyliśmy wstępnie przeszkolony transformator z głowicą parsującą biafinę, mając na celu wprowadzenie do transformatora wyraźnej wiedzy składniowej z bank drzew Universal Dependencies. Następnie dostosowujemy model dla zadań LU i mierzymy wpływ szkolenia pośredniego parsowania (IPT) na wydajność zadań LU. Wyniki zarówno jednojęzycznych eksperymentów z transferem języka angielskiego, jak i zero-shot (z pośrednim parsowaniem języka docelowego) pokazują, że wyraźna sformalizowana składnia, wstrzyknięta do transformatorów za pośrednictwem IPT, ma bardzo ograniczony i niespójny wpływ na wydajność LU. Nasze wyniki, w połączeniu z analizą przestrzeni reprezentacyjnych transformatorów przed i po parsowaniu pośrednim, stanowią istotny krok w kierunku udzielenia odpowiedzi na istotne pytanie: w jaki sposób (on)korzystanie jest nadzorowane parsowanie dla wysokiego poziomu semantycznego zrozumienia języka naturalnego w erze dużych modeli neuronowych?', 'sr': 'Tradicionalna NLP je dugo održala (nadzirana) sintaktičnu analizu potrebnu za uspešno razumevanje semantičkog jezika na višem nivou (LU). Nedavno dolazak neuralnih modela na kraju do kraja, koji su sami nadzirani putem jezičkog modela (LM), i njihov uspjeh na širokom nizu LU zadataka, međutim, ispituje ovu verovanje. U ovom poslu, empirički istražujemo korisnost nadzornog analiza semantičkog LU-a u kontekstu transformacijskih mreža koji su pretvorili LM. S obzirom na uspostavljenu paradigmu, prvi put smo par pretreniranog transformatora sa glavom za analizu biafina, ciljanjem da infuziramo ekskluzivno sintaktičko znanje od univerzalnih zavisnosti u transformator. Onda ćemo ispravno srediti model za zadatak LU-a i mjeriti učinak prosječnog treninga za analizu (IPT) na iznad funkcije LU-a. Rezultati od jednojezičkih i nulovnih eksperimenata za prebacivanje jezika (sa prosječnim analizacijom ciljeva) pokazuju da je ekskluzivna formalizovana sintaksa, injicirana u transformatore kroz IPT, vrlo ograničena i nesporazna efekat na snimku LU-a. Naši rezultati, zajedno sa našom analizom prostora predstavljanja transformatora prije i nakon prosječnog razmatranja, predstavljaju značajan korak ka pružanju odgovora na temeljno pitanje: kako je (un)pristupanje nadzirano razmatranje semantičkog razumevanja prirodnog jezika na visokom nivou u dobu velikih neuralnih modela?', 'si': 'Name අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් ඉවරයි න්\u200dයූරාල් මොඩේල් වලින් ස්වාමින් බලන්න, භාෂාව මොඩේල් වලින් (LM) වලින්, ඒ වගේම මේ වැඩේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා LM-ප්\u200dරීට්\u200dරේන්ටර් ජාලයේ සම්බන්ධ LU සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය කරලා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. ස්ථාපනය කරපු හොඳ සැකසුම් පාර්ඩිග්ම් එක සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න, අපි මුලින්ම ප්\u200dරිට්\u200dරේන්ස් කරපු ප්\u200dරවර්තකයෙක් බියාෆින් පාර්සික් ඔළුවෙක් ස ඊට පස්සේ අපි LU වැඩේ නිර්මාණය සහ LU වැඩේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය (IPT) ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිභාෂාත්මක ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ශූන් භාෂාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200d අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය, අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය සමග අපේ විශ්ලේෂණයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරකයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරකයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරකයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරකයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරකයක් කලින් පස්සේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා', 'so': "Aqoonsiga NLP waxay waqti dheer qabsatay (ilaaliyed) jardiinada syntactic oo loo baahan yahay si ay u guulaysto fahamka luqada semantika (LU). Dhacdooyinkii ugu dambeeyey tusaalooyinkii neurada ee ugu dambaysta ee ugu dambaysta ah, iskuu ilaaliyey tusaale ahaan luuqada (LM), iyo guulashadooda oo ku saabsan shaqooyin badan oo LU ah, habase yeeshee waxay is-weydiinaysaa rumaysadkaas. Markaas waxan, waxaynu si fiican u baaraynaa faa'iidada baaritaanka la ilaaliyey ee la ilaaliyey qoraalka badnaanta LU, marka lagu jiro shabakado beddelka ee LM-pretreed. Isku xiriira nidaamka saxda ah, marka ugu horeysa waxaynu isbedelaynaa isbedelka baaritaanka baaritaanka baaritaanka ee baabuurta ah, taas oo aad u baahan karto aqoonta muuqashada ah oo aad ka soo bandhigto suurtagalka jaamacadda. Markaas waxaynu sameynaynaa modelka shaqada LU waxaana qiyaasaynaa saamaynta waxbarashada dhexe ee baarlamaanka (IPT) ee sameynta shaqada LU hoose. Dhacdooyinka labada luuqadood ee afka ingiriisiga iyo luqada nuurka ah (with intermediate goal-parsing) waxay muujiyaan in aad si cad u formalisay syntada, laguugu soo jiiday bedelka IPT, wuxuu saameyn aad u adag yahay oo aan saameyn ku lahayn sameynta LU hoosteeda. Abaalkayaga, waxaa la isku daray baaritaankeenna kooxaha beddelka ka hor iyo xilliga baarlamaanka dhexe ka dib, waxay sameeyaan koob muhiim ah si ay uga jawaabto su'aal muhiim ah: sida loo ilaaliyaa baarlamaanka si ay u garto qoraalka afka hoose ee semantika ah xilliga modellada neurada weyn?", 'sv': 'Traditionell NLP har länge hållit (övervakad) syntaktisk tolkning nödvändig för framgångsrik semantisk språkförståelse (LU). Den senaste utvecklingen av end-to-end neurala modeller, självövervakade via språkmodellering (LM), och deras framgång på ett brett spektrum av LU-uppgifter ifrågasätter dock denna uppfattning. I detta arbete undersöker vi empiriskt användbarheten av övervakad tolkning för semantisk LU i samband med LM-förkränade transformatornätverk. Med utgångspunkt i det etablerade finjusterande paradigmet kopplar vi först ihop en förklädd transformator med ett biaffinpostningshuvud, som syftar till att tillföra explicit syntaktisk kunskap från Universal Dependences trädbanker till transformatorn. Vi finjusterar sedan modellen för LU-uppgifter och mäter effekten av Intermediate parsing Training (IPT) på LU-uppgifternas prestanda nedströms. Resultat från både enspråkiga engelska och noll-shot språköverföring experiment (med mellanliggande målspråk tolkning) visar att explicit formaliserad syntax, injicerad i transformatorer genom IPT, har mycket begränsad och inkonsekvent effekt på nedströms LU prestanda. Våra resultat, tillsammans med vår analys av transformatorers representationsrum före och efter mellanliggande tolkning, gör ett betydande steg mot att ge svar på en väsentlig fråga: hur (un)utnyttjande övervakas tolkning för semantisk naturspråkförståelse på hög nivå i en tid av stora neurala modeller?', 'ta': 'Traditional NLP has long held (supervised) syntactic parsing necessary for successful higher-level semantic language understanding (LU).  இறுதி முடிவு புதிய மாதிரிகளின் அண்மை இந்த வேலையில், நாம் வெறுமையாக ஆராய்ந்து கொள்கிறோம் LM-மாற்றும் மாற்று வலைப்பின்னல்களின் சூழலில் பெம்மானிக் லூய நிறைவேற்றப்பட்ட நல்ல கூட்டுதல் அளபுருக்கம் பற்றி தொடர்பு, நாம் முதலில் ஒரு பிபிபின் பாசிங் தலையை மாற்றுதல் செய்து, உலக சார்ந்த சார்ந்தத்திலிருந்து ம LU பணிகளுக்கான மாதிரியை நாம் நன்றாக குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் நடுத்திய பாடல் பயிற்சியின் விளைவுகளை அளக்குகிறோம். Name எங்கள் முடிவுகள், மாற்றங்களின் குறிப்பிட்ட இடைவெளிகளை முன் மற்றும் இடைவெளியில் சேர்க்கும் பின்னர், எங்கள் முடிவுகள் இணைந்து, ஒரு முக்கியமான கேள்விக்கு பதில் கொடுக்கும் முக', 'ur': 'Name آخر سے پائیں نئورل موڈل کے اخیر پہنچ گئے ہیں، زبان موڈلینگ (LM) کے ذریعے اپنے اوپر نظر کیا گیا ہے، اور ان کے کامیابی بہت سے LU کے کاموں پر، اگرچہ یہ ایمان سے پوچھتے ہیں۔ اس کام میں ہم مضبوط طور پر تحقیق کررہے ہیں کہ LM-pretrained transformer networks کے کنارے میں سیمنٹی LU کے لئے تحقیق کیا گیا ہے۔ ہم پہلی بار ایک پرٹرینڈ تغییر دیگر کے ساتھ ایک پرٹرینڈ تغییر دینے والی سر کے ساتھ جوڑ رہے ہیں، جس کا مطابق واضح سینٹکیٹیک علم کو Universal Dependencies Treebanks سے تغییر دینے والی تغییر دینے والی ہے. پھر ہم نے LU تاسکیوں کے مدل کو ٹھیک ٹھیک ٹھیک ٹھیک ٹھیک کر رکھا ہے اور نیچے نرم LU تاسکیوں کے کام پر میانہ پارسینگ تطارین (IPT) کا اثر اندازہ لیا ہے۔ دونوں انگلیسی اور صفر-شٹ زبان ترنسفور کی آزمائش کے نتائج (متوسط target-language parsing کے ساتھ) دکھاتے ہیں کہ صاف فرمولی سینٹکس، جو IPT کے ذریعہ تغییر کرنے والوں میں ڈال دی گئی ہے، بہت محدودہ اور ناکام اثر لئو کی پرورش پر ہے. ہمارے نتائج، تغییر پھیلانے والوں کی تعلیم جگہ سے پہلے اور پھیرے کے بعد، ایک ضروری سوال کے جواب دینے کے لئے ایک اہم قدم مقرر کریں: کس طرح (un)استفاده کرنا (un) استفاده کرنا) بڑے نیورال نمڈلوں کی مدت میں بلند سطح سیمانتیک طبیعی زبان سمجھنے کے لئے تحقیق کیا جاتا ہے؟', 'kk': 'Тәдімгі NLP сәтті семантикалық тілді түсінуге (LU) жеткілікті синтактикалық талдау үшін ұзын сақталды. Соңғы невралдық моделдері, тіл моделі (LM) арқылы өзгертілген, және олардың жетістіктері көптеген LU тапсырмалардың көптеген аралығында сұрақтайды. Бұл жұмыстың көмегімен, LM трансформациялық желілерінің контексті бақылаған LU симантикалық талдауының пайдалығын зерттеп отырмыз. Біз біріншіден биафин талдау басы арқылы жақсы түрлендіру парадигміне қатынасыз. Біріншіден, Universal Dependencies требанды түрлендіру үшін синтактикалық білімдерді түрлендіру арқылы білеміз. Содан кейін LU тапсырмаларының үлгісін түзеп, LU тапсырмаларының төмендету жұмысының орташа талдау оқытуының (IPT) эффектін өлшеміміз. Екі тілді ағылшын тілді және нөл- шоттық тілді аудару тәжірибелерінен (орташа мақсатты тілді талдау арқылы) тәжірибелері IPT арқылы түрлендірушілерге инжекцияланған официалдық синтаксисін көрсетеді. Төмендегі Біздің нәтижелеріміз, түрлендірушілердің кеңейту орындарының анализациясымыз алдында және орташа талдау кезінде, негізгі сұраққа жауаптарды беру үшін маңызды қадам жасайды: жоғары деңгейіндегі семантикалық тілді үлкен невралдық мо', 'uz': "Name Yaqinda yangi neyrolik modellari bilan o'zim modeli (LM) yordamida o'zimni nazorat qilish va ularning muvaffaqiyatli katta LU vazifalari bilan muvaffaqiyatli, lekin bu ishni so'raydi. Bu ishda, biz oddiy o'rganishni o'rganish uchun semantik LU'ning foydalanishini o'rganamiz. Biz birinchi birinchi bir necha o'zgarishni o'zgartirib, biz birinchi ko'pchilik bizga o'zgarishni o'rganamiz, biz Universal Dependency'dolaridan tashkilotni o'zgartirish uchun bir necha ko'pchilikni o'zgartirish uchun Keyin biz LU vazifalarining modelini yaxshi ko'rib chiqaramiz va LU vazifa bajarishida o'rtacha o'rtacha parsing (IPT) ta'limning natijasini o'ylab ko'rsamiz. Name Mana natijalarimiz, o'zgarishlar tashkilotlarining orasidan va orasidagi parsing joylarimizni analyzerimiz bilan bir muhim savol javob berish uchun juda muhim qadam qiladi: ajratish qanday qilib katta neyrol modellarida o'rganish uchun eng darajada semantik asl tilni ajratishga qaror qilinadi?", 'vi': 'Truyền thống ngôn ngữ không phải sử dụng từ lâu (giám sát) để phân tích cú pháp cần thiết cho việc hiểu ngôn ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ rộng hơn thành công. Sự xuất hiện gần đây của các mô hình thần kinh kết thúc, tự giám sát bằng cách tạo mẫu ngôn ngữ (LM) và sự thành công của họ trong một loạt các nhiệm vụ Luke, tuy nhiên, đặt câu hỏi này. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi có kinh nghiệm điều tra sự hữu ích của việc phân tích ngữ pháp tuân thủ khái niệm trường hợp của mạng chuyển hóa LM-premưa. Dựa trên mô hình được thiết lập độ chính xác, chúng tôi lần đầu làm cặp một máy biến thế trước với một cái đầu phân tách hai dính, nhằm hướng truyền ra kiến thức cú pháp trực tiếp từ các phụ thuộc chung vào máy biến đổi. Chúng tôi sẽ chỉnh sửa mô hình cho các nhiệm vụ cung cấp năng lượng trường và đo đạc hiệu quả của chương trình phân tích trung cấp (IPT) trên các hiệu suất làm việc kiểu dưới của trường luu. Kết quả từ thí nghiệm truyền ngôn ngữ ngữ ngữ chung và bắn không phát được (với phân tích ngôn ngữ đích tạm thời) cho thấy cú pháp chính thức rõ ràng, được tiêm vào máy biến đổi qua IPT, có hiệu ứng rất hạn chế và không ổn định với khả năng lãnh tụ của LUC. Kết quả của chúng ta, kết hợp với phân tích các khoảng cách đại diện của người biến đổi trước và sau phân tích trung tâm, tạo ra một bước quan trọng để cung cấp câu trả lời cho một câu hỏi quan trọng: làm thế nào (một)', 'bg': 'Традиционният НЛП отдавна поддържа (контролиран) синтактичен анализ, необходим за успешното разбиране на семантичен език на по-високо ниво. Неотдавнашното появяване на невронни модели от край до край, самостоятелно контролирани чрез езиково моделиране (ЛМ), и техният успех в широк спектър от задачи на ЛУ обаче поставят под въпрос тази вяра. В тази работа изследваме емпирично ползата от надзорния анализ за семантичен ЛУ в контекста на предварително тренирани трансформаторни мрежи. Разчитайки на утвърдената парадигма за фина настройка, първо съчетаваме предварително подготвен трансформатор с биафинова анализационна глава, целяща да внесем изрично синтактично знание от трилентовите ленти на Универсалните зависимости в трансформатора. След това фино настройваме модела за задачите на ЛУ и измерваме ефекта от междинното обучение за анализ (ИПТ) върху изпълнението на задачите на ЛУ надолу по веригата. Резултатите от едноезичен английски и нулев експеримент за трансфер на езика (с междинно анализиране на целевия език) показват, че изричният формализиран синтаксис, инжектиран в трансформаторите чрез IPT, има много ограничен и непоследователен ефект върху производителността на ЛУ надолу по веригата. Нашите резултати, съчетани с нашия анализ на пространствата за представяне на трансформаторите преди и след междинното анализиране, правят значителна стъпка към предоставянето на отговори на един съществен въпрос: как (не)оползотворяването е контролирано анализиране за високо ниво на семантичен естествен език разбиране в ерата на големите невронни модели?', 'da': 'Traditionel NLP har længe holdt (overvåget) syntaktisk parsing nødvendig for succesfuld semantisk sprogforståelse (LU). Den nylige fremkomst af end-to-end neurale modeller, selv-overvåget via sprogmodellering (LM), og deres succes på en bred vifte af LU opgaver, tvivler dog på denne tro. I dette arbejde undersøger vi empirisk nytten af overvåget parsing for semantisk LU i forbindelse med LM-forudtrænede transformatornetværk. Ved hjælp af det etablerede finjusterende paradigme parrer vi først en fortrænet transformer med et biaffin parsing hoved, der sigter mod at tilføre eksplicit syntaktisk viden fra Universal Dependences træbanker ind i transformeren. Vi finjusterer derefter modellen for LU-opgaver og måler effekten af intermediate parsing training (IPT) på downstream LU-opgavernes ydeevne. Resultater fra både ensproget engelsk og zero-shot sprogoverførsel eksperimenter (med mellemliggende målsprog parsing) viser, at eksplicit formaliseret syntaks, injiceret i transformere gennem IPT, har meget begrænset og inkonsekvent effekt på downstream LU ydeevne. Vores resultater, kombineret med vores analyse af transformatorers repræsentationsrum før og efter mellemliggende parsing, gør et væsentligt skridt i retning af at give svar på et væsentligt spørgsmål: Hvordan (un)benyttelse overvåges parsing for højt niveau semantisk natursprogforståelse i en æra af store neurale modeller?', 'nl': 'Traditioneel NLP heeft al lang (begeleide) syntactische parsing nodig voor succesvol hoger-level semantisch taalbegrip (LU). De recente komst van end-to-end neurale modellen, self-supervised via language modeling (LM), en hun succes op een breed scala aan LU-taken, stellen echter vraagtekens bij dit geloof. In dit werk onderzoeken we empirisch het nut van supervised parsing voor semantische LU in de context van LM-voorgetrainde transformatornetwerken. Op basis van het gevestigde fine-tuning paradigma koppelen we eerst een vooraf getrainde transformator met een biaffine parsing head, met als doel expliciete syntactische kennis van Universal Dependencies boombanken in de transformator te brengen. Vervolgens verfijnen we het model voor LU-taken en meten we het effect van de intermediate parsing training (IPT) op downstream LU-taakprestaties. Resultaten van zowel eentalig Engels als zero-shot taaloverdracht experimenten (met intermediaire target-language parsing) tonen aan dat expliciete geformaliseerde syntaxis, geïnjecteerd in transformatoren via IPT, zeer beperkt en inconsistent effect heeft op downstream LU prestaties. Onze resultaten, gekoppeld aan onze analyse van representatieruimtes van transformatoren voor en na intermediair parsen, maken een belangrijke stap in de richting van antwoorden op een essentiële vraag: hoe (on)benutten wordt begeleid parsen voor het begrijpen van semantische natuurlijke taal op hoog niveau in het tijdperk van grote neurale modellen?', 'hr': 'Tradicionalno NLP dugo održava (nadzirano) sintaktičko analiziranje potrebno za uspješno razumijevanje semantičkog jezika na višem nivou (LU). Nedavno dolazak neuralnih modela na kraju do kraja, koji su sami nadzirani putem jezičkog modela (LM), i njihov uspjeh na širokom nizu zadataka LU-a, međutim, pitaju ovu vjerovanje. U ovom poslu, empirički istražujemo korisnost nadzornog razmatranja semantičkog LU-a u kontekstu transformacijskih mreža preliječenih LM-om. S obzirom na uspostavljenu paradigmu, prvi put smo par pretkišnog transformatora sa glavom za analizu biafina, ciljanjem da infuziramo jasno sintaktičko znanje od univerzalnih zavisnosti u transformator. Zatim ćemo ispravno srediti model za zadatke LU-a i mjeriti učinak prosječnog obrazovanja analize (IPT) na uspješnost zadatka LU-a. Rezultati od jednojezičkih i nuloških eksperimenata prijenosa jezika (s prosječnim analizacijom ciljevnog jezika) pokazuju da je ekskluzivna formalizirana sintaksa injekcija u transformatore preko IPT-a vrlo ograničena i neskladna učinka na iznad učinka LU-a. Naši rezultati, zajedno sa analizom predstavljanja prostora transformatora prije i nakon prosječnog razmatranja, čine značajan korak ka pružanju odgovora na temeljno pitanje: kako je (un)pristupanje nadzirano razmatranje semantičkog razumijevanja prirodnog jezika u doba velikih neuralnih modela?', 'de': 'Traditionelles NLP hat lange Zeit (überwachte) syntaktische Parsing durchgeführt, die für erfolgreiches übergeordnetes semantisches Sprachverständnis (LU) erforderlich ist. Das jüngste Aufkommen neuronaler End-to-End-Modelle, die über Sprachmodellierung (LM) selbst überwacht werden, und ihr Erfolg bei einer Vielzahl von LU-Aufgaben stellt diese Überzeugung jedoch in Frage. In dieser Arbeit untersuchen wir empirisch die Nützlichkeit von Supervised Parsing für semantische LU im Kontext von LM-vortrainierten Transformatorennetzwerken. Basierend auf dem etablierten Feinabstimmungsparadigma koppeln wir zunächst einen vortrainierten Transformator mit einem Biaffin-Parsing-Kopf, um explizites syntaktisches Wissen aus Universal Dependencies Baumbänken in den Transformator einfließen zu lassen. Anschließend verfeinern wir das Modell für LU-Aufgaben und messen den Effekt des Intermediate Parsing Trainings (IPT) auf die nachgelagerte LU Task Performance. Ergebnisse sowohl aus einsprachigem Englisch als auch aus Zero-Shot-Sprachtransfer-Experimenten (mit Intermediate Target-Language Parsing) zeigen, dass explizite formalisierte Syntax, die über IPT in Transformatoren injiziert wird, sehr begrenzte und inkonsistente Auswirkungen auf die nachgeschaltete LU-Leistung hat. Unsere Ergebnisse, gekoppelt mit unserer Analyse der Repräsentationsräume von Transformatoren vor und nach dem Intermediate Parsing, machen einen wichtigen Schritt in Richtung Antworten auf eine wesentliche Frage: Wie (Un)Nutzen wird beaufsichtigt Parsing für ein hohes semantisches Verständnis natürlicher Sprache im Zeitalter großer neuronaler Modelle?', 'sw': 'Traditional NLP has long held (supervised) syntactic parsing necessary for successful higher-level semantic language understanding (LU).  Matokeo ya hivi karibuni ya mifano ya kiserikali ya mwisho, yanajitangaza kwa kutumia mifano ya lugha (LM), na mafanikio yao katika kazi nyingi za LU, hata hivyo, yanahoji imani hii. Katika kazi hii, tunachunguza matumizi ya mabadiliko yanayofuatiliwa kwa ajili ya chama cha LU katika mukhtadha wa mitandao ya mabadiliko ya LM iliyotarajiwa. Kuhusiana na msimamo mzuri ulioanzishwa, tunandoa mara ya kwanza mabadiliko ya mabadiliko yaliyojitokeza na kiongozi wa mabadiliko ya kibiashara, kwa lengo la kutumia maarifa ya wazi ya ushirikiano kutoka kwa matatizo ya ulimwengu. Kisha tunaweka mfano mzuri wa kazi za LU na kupima madhara ya mafunzo ya kati ya mabunge (IPT) kwenye utendaji wa kazi za LU. Matokeo kutoka kwa mbili za lugha za Kiingereza za za kimonolinguli na lugha za kuhamia sifuri (kwa ajili ya wimbo wa lugha za kati) yanaonyesha kwamba kodi lililorasmi rasmi, lililowekwa katika mabadiliko kupitia IPT, imekuwa na athari kubwa na isiyo na maana juu ya utendaji wa LU wa chini ya mto wa chini. Matokeo yetu, yaliunganishwa na uchambuzi wetu wa nafasi za uwakilishaji wa mabadiliko kabla na baada ya parge ya kati, kufanya hatua muhimu ili kutoa majibu ya swali muhimu: namna (usio) ubunifu unavyofuatiliwa na kuingia parking kwa ajili ya kuelewa lugha ya asili ya juu katika kipindi cha mifano makubwa ya ubongo wa neurali?', 'id': 'NLP tradisional telah lama mengadakan (mengawasi) penghuraian sintaks yang diperlukan untuk sukses pemahaman bahasa semantis tinggi (LU). Kemunculan baru-baru ini dari model saraf akhir-akhir, diawasi sendiri melalui model bahasa (LM), dan sukses mereka dalam jangkauan luas tugas LU, bagaimanapun, mempertanyakan keyakinan ini. In this work, we empirically investigate the usefulness of supervised parsing for semantic LU in the context of LM-pretrained transformer networks.  Bergantung pada paradigm a penyesuaian yang telah ditetapkan, kami pertama kali pasang transformer yang dilatih sebelum dilatih dengan kepala analisis biaffin, bertujuan untuk menginfusion pengetahuan sintaksi eksplicit dari bangku pohon Universal Dependencies ke dalam transformer. Kemudian kita memperbaiki model untuk tugas LU dan mengukur efek pelatihan analisis intermedium (IPT) pada prestasi tugas LU turun. Hasil dari percobaan transfer bahasa Inggris monobahasa dan bahasa zero-shot (dengan pemeriksaan target-bahasa intermedium) menunjukkan bahwa sintaks formalisasi eksplicit, disuntik ke transformer melalui IPT, memiliki efek yang sangat terbatas dan tidak konsisten pada prestasi LU turun. Hasil kami, bergabung dengan analisis kami dari ruang representation transformer sebelum dan setelah pemeriksaan sementara, membuat langkah yang signifikan menuju memberikan jawaban kepada pertanyaan penting: bagaimana (un)penggunaan diawasi pemeriksaan untuk pemahaman bahasa alam semantis tinggi di era model saraf besar?', 'ko': '전통적인 NLP는 오랫동안 문법 분석을 더욱 높은 차원의 의미 언어 이해(LU)를 성공적으로 실현하는 데 필수적이라고 여겨왔다.그러나 최근 언어모델링(LM)을 통해 자체 감독하는 끝에서 끝까지의 신경모델의 출현과 이들이 광범위한 LU 임무에서 성공했다는 신념에 의문을 제기했다.이 작업에서 우리는 LM예훈련 변환기 네트워크의 배경에서 의미LU의 감독 해석의 유용성을 실증적으로 연구했다.이미 만들어진 마이크로스피커 모델을 바탕으로 우리는 먼저 미리 훈련된 변환기와 이중 모방 해석 헤드를 결합시켜 유니버설 의존 트리 라이브러리의 현식 문법 지식을 변환기에 주입하고자 한다.그런 다음 LU 작업의 모델을 미세하게 조정하고 다운스트림 LU 작업 성능에 대한 중간 해결 훈련(IPT)의 영향을 측정합니다.단어 영어와 영포 언어 이동 실험(중간 목표 언어 해석)의 결과 IPT를 통해transformers를 주입하는 현식 형식화 문법이 하류LU 성능에 미치는 영향이 매우 제한적이고 일치하지 않는다는 것을 알 수 있다.우리의 결과에 따라 우리는 중간 해석 전후 변형금강 표시 공간에 대한 분석을 통해 하나의 기본적인 문제에 대답하는 데 중요한 일보를 내디뎠다. 대형 신경모델 시대에 감독 해석은 어떻게 고급 의미의 자연 언어 이해에 효과적으로 사용되는가?', 'fa': 'Name اخیراً رسیدن مدل\u200cهای عصبی که از طریق مدل\u200cسازی زبان\u200cها (LM) و موفقیت\u200cهایشان در مجموعه\u200cی عملیات متفاوت LU، با این حال، از این باور سوال می\u200cکنند. در این کار، ما به طور عمومی در مورد استفاده از تجزیه کردن تجزیه\u200cکننده\u200cی LU در محیط شبکه\u200cهای تغییر\u200cکننده\u200cهای LM تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. در ارتباط به پارادیگ درست ساخته شده، اولین بار یک تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cای که با یک سر پارش\u200cکننده\u200cی بیفاین است، به عنوان تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cی تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cای که می\u200cخواهد دانش\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای مشخصی را از تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cهای وابستگی جهانی به سپس ما مدل کارهای LU را خوب تنظیم می کنیم و تاثیر آموزش تجزیه بین\u200cالمللی (IPT) را بر عملکرد کارهای LU پایین اندازه می\u200cدهیم. نتیجه\u200cهایی از آزمایشات انتقال زبان انگلیسی تک زبان و صفر صفر (با تولید کردن هدف زبان) نشان می\u200cدهند که سنتاکس رسمی\u200cسازی مشخصی که به تغییر\u200cدهندگان از طریق IPT تغییر داده شده، اثر بسیار محدودیت و بی\u200cپایدار روی اجرای L نتایج ما، با تحلیل ما از فضای نمایش های تغییردهنده\u200cها قبل از و بعد از تجزیه\u200cهای متوسط، یک قدم بزرگی برای اجازه دادن پاسخ\u200cهای یک سوال اصلی انجام دهید: چگونه (un)استفاده از تجزیه\u200cها برای درک زبان طبیعی طبیعی بالا در زمان مدل\u200cهای عصبی بزرگ تحلیل می\u200cشود؟', 'sq': "NLP tradicionale ka mbajtur gjatë analizimin (mbikqyrjen) sintaktik të nevojshëm për kuptimin e gjuhës semantike më të suksesshme (LU). The recent advent of end-to-end neural models, self-supervised via language modeling (LM), and their success on a wide range of LU tasks, however, questions this belief.  Në këtë punë, ne empirikisht hetojmë dobinë e analizimit të mbikqyrur për LU semantike në kontekstin e rrjeteve të transformuesve të stërvitur nga LM. Duke u mbështetur në paradigm ën e rregullimit të vendosur, ne së pari çiftojmë një transformues të parastërvitur me një kokë analizuese biffin, që synon të futë njohuri sintaktike eksplicite nga bazat e drurit të Varësive Universale në transformuesin. We then fine-tune the model for LU tasks and measure the effect of the intermediate parsing training (IPT) on downstream LU task performance.  Rezultatet nga eksperimentet monogjuhësore të transferimit të gjuhës angleze dhe zero-shot gjuhës (me analizimin e ndërmjetësuar të gjuhës-objektiv) tregojnë se sintaksi e formalizuar eksplicit, e injektuar në transformuesit nëpërmjet IPT, ka efekt shumë të kufizuar dhe jo konsistent në performancën e LU në vazhdim. Our results, coupled with our analysis of transformers' representation spaces before and after intermediate parsing, make a significant step towards providing answers to an essential question: how (un)availing is supervised parsing for high-level semantic natural language understanding in the era of large neural models?", 'tr': 'D채pli NLP uzak d체z체mlenmi힊 semantik dillerin d체힊체nmesi 체챌in gerekli syntaksi첵a analyzasy bar. I흫 so흫ky n채yral modelleri흫 geleni, diller modelle첵채n (LM) bilen 철zlerine g철zle첵채n, we olary흫 ba힊arylygyny흫 birn채챌e g철rn체힊lerinde bu ynamy sora첵arlar. Bu i힊de, biz empirik bilen LU semantik LU 체챌in g철zlenen 챌철z체mleme 체챌in ulanylygyny barla첵arys. 캅lk ba힊lang캇챌 g체zel ayarlama paradigmesine ba휓lan캇yoruz, bir biafin ay캇rma kafas캇yla 철n체ne d철n체힊t체r체c체 철rg체t체c체 ile bilim a 챌캇k sintaktik bilgi almay캇 ama챌lad캇k. Sonra LU g철revleri 체챌in nusgany gowy 챌yk첵arys we LU g철revlerini a힊akda 챌yky힊 etmek 체챌in orta 챌yky힊 e휓itimi (IPT) t채sirini 철l챌체p 챌yk첵arys. I흫lis챌e we 0-atly dil g철챌체rmek deneylerini흫 netijesi (orta maksada dil analyzasy bilen) be첵leki formaly syntaksi, IPT aralygy bilen terjime edilen terjime edilen, i흫 a힊aky LU t채sirinde 철r채n 챌ykarylmaz we onsuz t채siri bar. Bizi흫 netijelerimiz, transformat챌ylary흫 t채ze sele흫leri 철흫 we orta 챌yky힊 eden so흫ra, jogaplarymyzy m철h체m soragyna beren 챌철z체mleri n채dip (un)첵okary 첵okary dereje semantik tebigat dillerini흫 d체힊체nmesi 체챌in g철zlen첵채r?', 'az': 'NLP müvəffəqiyyəti yüksək səviyyədə semantik dillərin anlaşılması (LU) üçün çox uzun müddətli sintaktik analizi saxladı. Nəyral modellərin son-son gəlməsi, dil modelləri (LM) vasitəsilə özlərinə nəzarət edilmiş və onların başarısızlığı bu inancın çoxluğuna görə çoxlu LU işlərində soruşur. Biz bu işdə, LM-dən əvvəlki transformer ağlarının məlumatlarında, semantik LU üçün gözlənmiş analizi faydalanılığını incidirik. Biz ilk dəfə bifin ayırması başı ilə müəyyən edilmiş, Universal Dependencies tərəfindən müəyyən edilmiş sintaktik bilgiləri dəyişdirmək istəyirik. Sonra LU işlərinin modelini düzəltdik və LU işlərinin aşağı təcrübəsi təcrübəsinin etkisini ölçürük. İki dil monodili və sıfır dil transfer eksperimentlərin sonuçları (orta məqsəd dili analizi ilə) IPT vasitəsilə transformatçılara istifadə edilən açıq formalizi sintaks olduğunu göstərər. Bizim sonuçlarımız, əvvəl və orta analizimizdən sonra transformatörlərin göstərilməsi alanların analizi ilə birlikdə, böyük nöral modellərin ça ğında yüksək səviyyə semantik dillərin anlaşılması üçün necə gözləyir?', 'af': "Tradisjoneel NLP het lank gehou (superviseer) sintakteel verwerking nodig vir suksesvol hoër vlak semantiese taal verstaan (LU). Die onlangse adventure van einde-tot-einde neurale modele, self-superviseer deur taal modellering (LM), en hulle sukses op 'n groot reek van LU-taak, maar vrae hierdie geloof. In hierdie werk ondersoek ons empiriese die gebruikerheid van die ondersoekte verwerking vir semantiese LU in die konteks van LM-pretrained transformer netwerke. Aangaande die geïnstalleerde fyn-tuning paradigme, het ons eerste paar 'n pretreënde transformeerder met 'n biaffine-verwerking kop, met die doel om eksplisiese sintaktieke kennis te gebruik van universele afhanklikheidse treebanks in die transformeerder. Ons het dan die model vir LU-opdragte fin-tuneer en die effek van die middelste verwerking onderwerp (IPT) op onderstreem LU-opdrag-prestasie gemeet. Resultate van beide monolinglike Engels en zero- shot taal oordrag eksperimente (met middelste doel- taal verwerking) vertoon dat eksplisiese formaliseerde sintaks, ingevoer in transformers deur IPT, baie beperk en inkonsistente effek het op onderstreem LU uitvoering. Ons resultate, saam met ons analiseer van transformeerders se verteenwoordigheidspasies voor en na middelte verwerking, maak 'n betekende stap teen verskaffing van antwoordes na 'n betekende vraag: hoe (un) beskikbaar is verwerking vir hoë vlak semantiese natuurlike taal verstanding in die era van groot neurale modele?", 'bs': 'Tradicionalno NLP dugo održava (nadzirano) sintaktičko analiziranje potrebno za uspješno razumijevanje semantičkog jezika na višem nivou (LU). Nedavno dolazak neuralnih modela na kraju do kraja, koji su sami nadzirani putem jezičkog modela (LM), i njihov uspjeh na širokom nizu zadataka LU-a, međutim, ispituje to vjerovanje. U ovom poslu, mi empirički istražujemo korisnost nadzornog analiza za semantičku LU u kontekstu transformacijskih mreža koje su pretvorile LM. S obzirom na uspostavljenu paradigmu, prvi put smo par pretkinutog transformer a sa glavom za analizu biafina, ciljanjem da infuziramo eksplicitno sintaktičko znanje od univerzalnih zavisnosti u transformator. Zatim ćemo ispravljati model za zadatke LU-a i mjeriti učinak prosječne obuke za analizu (IPT) na iznad funkcije LU-a. Rezultati od jednojezičkih i nulografskih eksperimenata prijenosa jezika (sa prosječnim analizacijom ciljeva) pokazuju da je eksplicitna formalizirana sintaksa, injicirana u transformatore kroz IPT, vrlo ograničena i nesposobna učinka na snimku LU-a. Naši rezultati, zajedno sa našom analizom prostora predstavljanja transformatora prije i nakon prosječnog razmatranja, predstavljaju značajan korak ka pružanju odgovora na temeljno pitanje: kako (un)pristupanje nadzire razmatranje semantičkog razumijevanja prirodnog jezika visokog nivoa u doba velikih neuralnih modela?', 'ca': "L'NLP tradicional fa molt de temps que està fent l'analització sinàctica (supervisada) necessària per a entendre el llenguatge semàntic d'un nivell més èxit (LU). The recent advent of end-to-end neural models, self-supervised via language modeling (LM), and their success on a wide range of LU tasks, however, questions this belief.  En aquest treball, investigam empíricament l'utilitat de l'analització supervisada de LU semàntica en el context de xarxes de transformadors pré-entrenats per LM. Confiant en el paradigm a estabelect d'ajustes fins, primer parelem un transformador pré-entrenat amb un cap d'analització biaffina, amb l'objectiu d'infusar coneixements sinàctics explícits dels bancs d'arbres de Universal Dependencies al transformador. We then fine-tune the model for LU tasks and measure the effect of the intermediate parsing training (IPT) on downstream LU task performance.  Results from both monolingual English and zero-shot language transfer experiments (with intermediate target-language parsing) show that explicit formalized syntax, injected into transformers through IPT, has very limited and inconsistent effect on downstream LU performance.  Our results, coupled with our analysis of transformers' representation spaces before and after intermediate parsing, make a significant step towards providing answers to an essential question: how (un)availing is supervised parsing for high-level semantic natural language understanding in the era of large neural models?", 'bn': 'Traditional NLP has long held (supervised) syntactic parsing necessary for successful higher-level semantic language understanding (LU).  সম্প্রতি নিউরেল মডেলের শেষ পর্যন্ত সাম্প্রতিক অভিযান, ভাষা মডেলিং (এলএম) মাধ্যমে নিজেকে পর্যবেক্ষণ করা হয়েছে এবং এলইউ কাজের বিভিন্ন বিভি এই কাজে আমরা ক্ষমতাভাবে তদন্ত করি এলএম-প্রেমিক পরিবর্তনের নেটওয়ার্ক নেটওয়ার্কের প্রেক্ষিতে সেম্পেন্টিক এলইউ-এর জন্য পর্যবেক্ বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের নির্ভরিত বিভাগের বিষয়ে আমরা প্রথমে একটি বিফিন পার্সিং মাথার সাথে প্রতিনিধিত্বিত পরিবর্তনের সাথে দুজনের সাথে প্রথম দুই প্রথম দুই প্ এরপর আমরা এলইউ কাজের মডেল সুন্দর করি এবং মাঝামাঝি পার্সিং প্রশিক্ষণ (আইপিটি) নিচে এলইউ কাজের কাজের প্রভাব পরিমাপ করি। মোনোলিভাল ইংরেজী এবং শূন্য-শুট ভাষা পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে (মাধ্যমিক লক্ষ্য-ভাষার পার্সিং সহ) দেখাচ্ছে যে আইপিটি মাধ্যমে প্রকাশিত সিন্ট্যাক্স, পরিবর্তনের মধ্য আমাদের ফলাফল, আমাদের প্রতিনিধিত্বের স্থানের বিশ্লেষণের পূর্বে এবং মধ্যবর্তী পার্গিং এর পরে এক গুরুত্বপূর্ণ প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রদানের জন্যে একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ পদক্ষেপ তৈরি করেছে: বি', 'am': 'የባሕላዊው NLP ረጅም (ተጠባባቂው) ለደረጃ ደረጃው የsemantic ቋንቋ ማስተዋል ያስፈልጋል፡፡ የመጨረሻው የኒውራዊ ሞዴል፣ በቋንቋ ምሳሌ (LM) የተለየ ራሳቸውን ተጠቃሚ እና የድል ስራ በተለያዩ የLU ስራ ክፍሎች ላይ ድል ግንኙነት ግን ይህ እምነት ይጠይቃቸዋል፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ ለኤም-የተለየ ለውጦች መረብ ውስጥ የተደረገውን የስሜቲካ LU ማኅበረሰብ ጥቅም በማድረግ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ Relying on the established fine-tuning paradigm, we first couple a pretrained transformer with a biaffine parsing head, aiming to infuse explicit syntactic knowledge from Universal Dependencies treebanks into the transformer.  በዚያን ጊዜ ለLU ስራዎችን እናሳውቃለን እና የመካከለኛውን ፓርቲ ትምህርት (IPT) በኤሉስ ስራ ማድረግ ላይ እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ ከሞናልቋዊ እንግሊዘኛ እና ከ0-shot ቋንቋ ለውጥ ፈተናዎች (በመካከለኛው target-ቋንቋ ማዘጋጀት) ፍሬዎች በIPT በመጠቀም ለለውጦች የተነጠቀው ግልፅ የተደረገ እና በዋነኛ ጉዳይ የLU አድራሻ ላይ የተደረገ ጥሩ ነው፡፡ ፍጥረታችን፣ ቀድሞ እና ከመካከለኛው ማኅበረሰብ በኋላ የመለወጥ ቦታዎችን በማስተካከል እና በመካከለኛው ማኅበረሰብ እና በመጠየቅ ጥያቄ መልስ ለመስጠት የሚያስፈልገውን ትልቅ እርምጃዎች አደረግን፤ እንዴት (የማይ) መጠቀም በታላቅ ደረጃዎች ላይ የsemantic ቋንቋ ማስተዋል ትልቅ ነው፡፡', 'fi': 'Perinteisessä NLP:ssä on pitkään pidetty (valvottu) syntaktinen jäsennys, joka on välttämätön onnistuneelle semanttisen kielen ymmärtämiselle (LU). Kielimallinnan (LM) kautta ohjattujen end-to-end neuromallien viimeaikainen tulo ja niiden menestys lukuisissa LU-tehtävissä kyseenalaistavat kuitenkin tämän uskomuksen. Tässä työssä tutkitaan empiirisesti semanttisen LU:n ohjatun parsauksen hyödyllisyyttä LM-esivalmennettujen muuntajaverkkojen kontekstissa. Perustuen vakiintuneeseen hienosäätöparadigmaan, paritamme ensin esikoulutetun muuntajan biafiiniparsauspään, jonka tavoitteena on infusoida muuntajaan eksplisiittinen syntaktinen tieto Universaalisten riippuvuuksien puupankeista. Tämän jälkeen hienosäädämme mallin LU-tehtäviin ja mittaamme väliparsauskoulutuksen (IPT) vaikutusta LU-tehtävien suoritukseen. Sekä yksikielisten englannin että nollahaun kielen siirtokokeiden tulokset (keskitason kohdekielen jäsentämisellä) osoittavat, että muuntajiin IPT:n kautta syötetyllä nimenomaisella virallisella syntaksilla on hyvin rajallinen ja epäjohdonmukainen vaikutus loppukäyttäjäverkon suorituskykyyn. Tuloksemme yhdessä muuntajien esitystilojen analyysin kanssa ennen ja jälkeen väliparsausta ovat merkittävä askel kohti vastausta olennaiseen kysymykseen: miten (ei)hyödyntäminen on valvottua parsausta korkean tason semanttisen luonnollisen kielen ymmärtämiseksi suurten neuromallien aikakaudella?', 'et': 'Traditsioonilisel NLP-l on pikka aega olnud (järelevalve all) süntaktiline parsimine, mis on vajalik edukaks kõrgema taseme semantilise keele mõistmiseks (LU). Hiljutine lõpp-lõpuni neuromudelite teke, mida juhitakse ise keele modelleerimise kaudu (LM), ja nende edu paljudes LU ülesannetes seavad siiski selle uskumuse kahtluse alla. Käesolevas töös uurime empiiriliselt semantilise LU järelevalve parsimise kasulikkust LM-eeltreenitud trafovõrkude kontekstis. Tuginedes väljakujunenud peenhäälestuse paradigmale, paarime esmalt eeltreenitud trafo biafiini parsimispeaga, mille eesmärk on infundeerida trafosse selgesõnalised süntaktilised teadmised universaalsetest sõltuvustest. Seejärel täpsustame mudelit LU ülesannete jaoks ja mõõdame vahepealse parsimiskoolituse (IPT) mõju LU järgnevale ülesandele. Nii ühekeelsete inglise keele kui ka nullkeelsete keeleülekannete katsete tulemused (vahepealse sihtkeele parsimisega) näitavad, et selgesõnaliselt formaliseeritud süntaksil, mis sisestatakse transformaatoritesse IPT kaudu, on väga piiratud ja ebaühtlane mõju LU järgnevale jõudlusele. Meie tulemused koos transformaatorite esindusruumide analüüsiga enne ja pärast vahepealset parsimist annavad olulise sammu vastuste andmisel olulisele küsimusele: kuidas (mitte)kasutamine on järelevalve all parsimine kõrgetasemelise semantilise looduskeele mõistmiseks suurte närvimudelite ajastul?', 'cs': 'Tradiční NLP dlouhodobě provádí syntaktickou analýzu nezbytnou pro úspěšné porozumění sémantického jazyka na vyšší úrovni (LU). Nedávný příchod end-to-end neuronových modelů, samozřejmě dohlížených prostřednictvím jazykového modelování (LM), a jejich úspěch na široké škále LU úkolů ovšem zpochybňuje toto přesvědčení. V této práci empiricky zkoumáme užitečnost supervisovaného parsování pro sémantické LU v kontextu transformátorových sítí s předtrénovaným LM. Na základě zavedeného paradigmatu jemného ladění jsme nejprve spárovali předtrénovaný transformátor s biafinovou parsovací hlavou, abychom do transformátoru vložili explicitní syntaktické znalosti z břehů stromů Universal Dependences. Následně vyladíme model pro úkoly LU a měříme vliv intermediate parsing training (IPT) na výkon následných úkolů LU. Výsledky jednojjazyčné angličtiny i experimentů s nulovým přenosem jazyků (s intermediální analýzou cílového jazyka) ukazují, že explicitní formalizovaná syntaxe, vstřikovaná do transformátorů pomocí IPT, má velmi omezený a nekonzistentní vliv na výkon následných LU. Naše výsledky spolu s analýzou reprezentačních prostorů transformátorů před a po intermediálním parsování dělají významný krok směrem k poskytnutí odpovědí na základní otázku: jak (un)využití je supervisované parsování pro vysoce úrovňové porozumění sémantického přirozeného jazyka v éře velkých neuronových modelů?', 'hy': 'Հավանդական ՆԼՊ-ը երկար ժամանակ ունի (վերահսկված) սինտակտիկ վերլուծություն, որը անհրաժեշտ է ավելի բարձր մակարդակի սեմանտիկ լեզվի հասկանալու համար: Վերջին-վերջին նյարդային մոդելների հայտնաբերությունը, որը ինքնավերահսկվում է լեզվի մոդելների միջոցով, և նրանց հաջողությունը Լուզիայի համալսարանի բազմաթիվ խնդիրներում, այնուամենայնիվ, հարցնում է այս հավատը: In this work, we empirically investigate the usefulness of supervised parsing for semantic LU in the context of LM-pretrained transformer networks.  Հաշվի առնելով հաստատված բարձրակարգման պարադիգմանին, մենք առաջին անգամ մի նախապատրաստ վերափոխողի հետ միանում ենք բիաֆինի վերլուծության գլխավորով, որի նպատակով է ներշնչել բացահայտ սինտակտիկ գիտելիքներ Universal Depndenties ծառերի հիմքերից վերափոխողի մեջ: We then fine-tune the model for LU tasks and measure the effect of the intermediate parsing training (IPT) on downstream LU task performance.  Results from both monolingual English and zero-shot language transfer experiments (with intermediate target-language parsing) show that explicit formalized syntax, injected into transformers through IPT, has very limited and inconsistent effect on downstream LU performance.  Մեր արդյունքները, միասին մեր վերլուծությամբ վերափոխողների ներկայացման տարածքների վերլուծությամբ մինչև միջին վերլուծությունը և դրանից հետո, կարևոր քայլ են կատարում մի կարևոր հարցի պատասխաններ տալու համար. ինչպես է օգտագործումը վերահսկվում վերլուծությամբ բարձր մակարդակի սեմանտիկ բնական լեզվի հասկացու', 'sk': 'Tradicionalni NLP ima dolgo (nadzorovano) sintaktično razčlenjevanje, potrebno za uspešno razumevanje semantičnega jezika na višji ravni. Nedavni prihod celovitih nevronskih modelov, ki se samonadzorujejo prek jezikovnega modeliranja (LM), in njihov uspeh pri številnih nalogah LU pa dvomi v to prepričanje. V tem delu empirično raziskujemo uporabnost nadzorovanega razčlenjevanja semantičnega LU v kontekstu LM-pretreeniranih transformatorskih omrežij. Na podlagi uveljavljene paradigme finega uglaševanja smo najprej povezali predtrenirani transformator z biafinsko razčlenjevalno glavo, da bi v transformator vnesli eksplicitno sintaktično znanje iz drevesnih plošč Univerzalne odvisnosti. Nato natančno nastavimo model za naloge LU in merimo učinek vmesnega usposabljanja za razčlenitev (IPT) na uspešnost nalog LU nadaljnjega. Rezultati poskusov enojezičnega angleščine in ničelnega jezikovnega prenosa (z vmesnim razčlenjevanjem ciljnega jezika) kažejo, da ima eksplicitna formalizirana sintaksa, vbrizgana v transformatorje prek IPT, zelo omejen in neskladen učinek na učinkovitost življenjskega omrežja. Naši rezultati, skupaj z analizo predstavitvenih prostorov transformatorjev pred in po vmesnem razčlenjanju, naredijo pomemben korak k zagotavljanju odgovorov na bistveno vprašanje: kako (ne)izkoriščanje je nadzorovano razčlenjanje za razumevanje semantičnega naravnega jezika na visoki ravni v dobi velikih nevronskih modelov?', 'jv': 'Chinese, Simplified Awak dhéwé, njuk-uwong ngomong nik model de maneh-uwong, iso nguasai perusahaan ning limu model (LM), lan susahé dhéwé nganggep sistem sing di luwih basa LU, mengko iso nggunakake kuwi. Nang iki trabah, kita empireksi perusahaan kelangan kelangan seneng dipunanggunian karo semanti LU in the context of LM-preranisasi tambah Dayelim piyambak masalah We unyak iso nggawe model kanggo LU tasks lan soko iso nggawe efek karo intermediate Rejalong kapan tanggal ingkang sampeyan ingkang karo iso nggambar tarjamahan kanggo 0 (karo meta-tarjamahan tarjamahan karo urip) sumusun kelangan kelangan seneng kesalakno, inseksi kanggo transformer liwih Awak dhéwé, nggunakake karo hal-hal akeh banjuré sing perusahaan anyar tentang karo ingkang intermediate, dadi sekang karo ngono nggawe barang apakno sing dikaroli dianggap nganggep kuwi sisaan sing dibutungane gambar: piye (un)', 'he': 'NLP מסורתית קיימה כבר הרבה זמן בדיקת סינטקטיקה (מפקחת) הנדרשת להבין שפת סמנטית ברמה גבוהה (LU) מצליחה. ההופעה האחרונה של דוגמנים עצביים בסוף עד הסוף, שפוקחים על עצמם דרך דוגמנית שפה (LM), וההצלחה שלהם על מגוון רחב של משימות LU, עם זאת, מפקפקת באמונה זו. בעבודה הזאת, אנו חוקרים באמפריה את השימוש של בדיקת מבוקשת עבור LU סמנטית בתוך הקשר של רשתות המעברים המתאימות לפני LM. בהתבסס על הפרדיגמה המבוססת להתאים, קודם מזוגים משתנה מלפנים עם ראש מחקר ביאפין, המטרה לתפוס ידע סינטאקטי מוחלט מהתלויות היניברסליות עצים לתוך המשתנה. ואז אנחנו מתאימים את המודל למשימות LU ומדידידים את ההשפעה של האימונים באמצעות בדיקות (IPT) על ביצוע משימות LU מתקדם. תוצאות שני ניסויים של העברת שפת אנגלית מונושפתית ואפסית (עם בדיקת שפת המטרה בינונית) מראות כי סינטקס רשמי ברור, הוזרק לתוך משתנים דרך IPT, יש השפעה מאוד מוגבלת וחסרת תועלת על ביצועי LU מתקדמים. התוצאות שלנו, יחד עם הניתוח שלנו של מרחבי היציגה של משתנים לפני ואחרי בדיקת בינונית, עושים צעד משמעותי לכיוון מספק תשובות לשאלה חיונית: איך (un)השימוש מופיע על בדיקת לשפה טבעית סמנטית רמה גבוהה בתקופה של מודלים עצביים גדולים?', 'ha': "@ item license (short name) @ info: whatsthis Daga wannan aikin, za mu yi ƙidãya wa amfani da aka tsare parparse wa semantic LU cikin context of LM-late transformer tarums. Ina jiɓinci da aka samar da jarrabi mai kyau, sai mu farkon para sauri da zafi ta shige na kafaffin da za'a yi amfani da zanen bayafi na kafin da za'a yi amfani da bayani na fasahan tamkar ta dukkan Duniyar Duniani. Sa'an nan kuma muna gyarar misalin wa aikin LU kuma Mu cika mai amfani da aikin mai tsakanin parse (IPT) a kan aikin LU. Result from both monolilanguage and no-shot language transfer (with interMidate-language parsinging) show that an bayyana formalized syntaki, injised to transformers through IPT, has significant and unsatin Eficacy on performance downriver LU. MatamayinMu, aka samu da anayyar filayen masu motsari na daban da suka yi parse a gabãnin da kuma a bayan mai tsakanin parse, sai ka sami wata hanyo mai muhimmi zuwa ya bãyar da majibu zuwa tambayi muhimu: don a tsare (un)", 'bo': "རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ནི་NLP ཡིས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཁང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པས་རྒྱལ་སྐྱོར་བའི་སྐད་རིགས རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་སྐད་རིགས་modeling (LM) དང་ཁོང་ཚོའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་མཐོང་བའི་མི་དཔེ་གཞི་གྲངས་སུ་མཐོང་མི་འདུག། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ལྟ་བུའི་རིམ་པ་ཚོའི་ལག་ལེན་སྟངས་ཡོད་པའི་ལག་ལེན་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། མཐོང་སྣང་བཟོས་བའི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྒྱུད་ལམ་ལ་ངེད་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་བཟོ་བཅོས་པ་ཞིག་གིས་ འོན་ཀྱང་། Results from both monolingual English and zero-shot language transfer experiments (with intermediate target-language parsing) show that explicit formalized syntax, injected into transformers through IPT, has very limited and inconsistent effect on downstream LU performance. Our results, coupled with our analysis of transformers' representation spaces before and after intermediate parsing, make a significant step towards providing answers to an essential question: how (un)availing is supervised parsing for high-level semantic natural language understanding in the era of large neural models?"}
{'en': 'Facilitating Terminology Translation with Target Lemma Annotations', 'fr': 'Faciliter la traduction terminologique avec les annotations du lemme', 'pt': 'Facilitando a tradução de terminologia com anotações de lema de destino', 'ar': 'تسهيل ترجمة المصطلحات باستخدام شروح الهدف Lemma', 'zh': '引理注趣进术语译', 'ja': 'ターゲットLemmaアノテーションを使用した用語の翻訳の促進', 'es': 'Facilitar la traducción de terminología con anotaciones de lema objetivo', 'hi': 'लक्ष्य Lemma एनोटेशन के साथ शब्दावली अनुवाद की सुविधा', 'ga': 'Aistriú Téarmaíochta le Anótálacha Leama Spriocanna a éascú', 'ru': 'Облегчение перевода терминологии с помощью целевых аннотаций Lemma', 'ka': 'ტერმინოლოგიის გადაწყვეტილების გამოყენება მისამართელი ლემის ანოტაციებით', 'hu': 'A terminológia fordításának elősegítése a cél Lemma megjegyzésekkel', 'el': 'Διευκόλυνση της μεταφράσεως ορολογίας με σχολιασμούς Λέματος στόχου', 'it': 'Facilitare la traduzione di terminologia con annotazioni Target Lemma', 'kk': 'Терминологиялық аудармаларды мақсатты Lemma жазбаларымен көмектесу', 'lt': 'Terminologijos vertimo tikslinėmis lemmos anotacijomis palengvinimas', 'mk': 'Олеснување на преведувањето на терминологијата со анатизите на мета Лема', 'ml': 'ടെര്\u200dമിനോളജി പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ടെര്\u200dമിനോളജി ലെമ്മാ അറിവുകളുമായി ഫാക്സിലേറ്റിന്\u200d', 'mt': 'L-iffaċilitar tat-Traduzzjoni tat-Terminoloġija bl-Annotazzjonijiet tal-Lemma fil-mira', 'mn': 'Терминологийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн Лема анзаарлыг нэмэгдүүлэх', 'ms': 'Memmudahkan Terjemahan Terminologi dengan Annotasi Target Lemma', 'no': 'Utvikling av terminologisk omsetjing med målLemma- notasjonar', 'pl': 'Ułatwianie tłumaczenia terminologii za pomocą adnotacji target lemma', 'ro': 'Facilitarea traducerii terminologiei cu adnotări de lemma vizate', 'sr': 'Pomoći terminološki prevod sa oznakem cilja Leme', 'so': 'Turjumista Terminology with Target Lemma Annotations', 'sv': 'Underlätta terminologiöversättning med Target Lemma-kommentarer', 'si': 'ලක්ෂණ ලම්මා කිරීම සඳහා තර්මිනෝලික වාර්ථාව අවශ්\u200dය කරන්න', 'ur': 'Target Lemma Annotations', 'ta': 'Facilitating Terminology Translation with Target Lemma Annotations', 'uz': 'Tarjima Lemma taʼriflari bilan Terminalologni tahrirlash', 'vi': 'Dễ dàng dịch thuật ngữ với mục sư Lemma', 'da': 'Gør det lettere at oversætte terminologi med Target Lemma-noteringer', 'bg': 'Улесняване на терминологичния превод с анотации на целевата лема', 'nl': 'Het vergemakkelijken van terminologische vertaling met target lemma annotaties', 'hr': 'Uspoređivanje prevoda terminologije sa oznakem cilja Lemma', 'id': 'Memmudahkan Terjemahan Terminologi dengan Target Lemma Annotations', 'de': 'Erleichterung der Übersetzung von Terminologien mit Target Lemma Annotationen', 'fa': 'افزایش ترجمه\u200cشناسی با نشانه\u200cهای هدف Lemma', 'ko': '목표 인용 주석을 이용하여 용어 번역을 촉진하다', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Terminology na Tamko la Lemma', 'tr': 'Terminologiýa terjimeleri maksyklandyrmak üçin', 'af': 'Beskikbaar Terminologie Vertaling met Teël Lemma Opmerking', 'sq': 'Duke lehtësuar përkthimin e terminologjisë me anotacionet e objektivit Lemma', 'hy': 'Թերմինոլոգիայի թարգմանման հեշտացումը նպատակային Լեման նատորակներով', 'am': 'ትርጉም', 'az': 'Terminoloji T톛rc칲m톛ni M톛qs톛d Lemma Annotations il톛 Facilitate', 'cs': 'Usnadnění překladu terminologie pomocí cílových lemmových anotací', 'bn': 'টার্মিনোলজি অনুবাদ করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Uspoređivanje prevoda terminologije sa oznakem cilja Lemma', 'ca': "Facilitar la traducció de terminologia amb les anotacions de Lemma d'objectiu", 'et': 'Terminoloogia tõlkimise hõlbustamine sihtlemma annotatsioonidega', 'fi': 'Terminologian kääntämisen helpottaminen kohdelemman huomautuksilla', 'sk': 'Omogočanje prevajanja terminologije z opombami ciljnih lem', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'להקל את התרגום הטרמינולוגי עם הערות למה המטרה', 'bo': 'མཐའ་སྐུལ་གྱི་མཐའ་བརྗོད་གཞིའི་ཚིག་རྒྱུན་ལ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ལྟར་འགྲེལ་བཤད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།', 'jv': 'Layout first'}
{'en': 'Most of the recent work on terminology integration in machine translation has assumed that terminology translations are given already inflected in forms that are suitable for the target language sentence. In day-to-day work of professional translators, however, it is seldom the case as translators work with bilingual glossaries where terms are given in their dictionary forms ; finding the right target language form is part of the translation process. We argue that the requirement for apriori specified target language forms is unrealistic and impedes the practical applicability of previous work. In this work, we propose to train machine translation systems using a source-side data augmentation method that annotates randomly selected source language words with their target language lemmas. We show that systems trained on such augmented data are readily usable for terminology integration in real-life translation scenarios. Our experiments on terminology translation into the morphologically complex Baltic and Uralic languages show an improvement of up to 7 BLEU points over baseline systems with no means for terminology integration and an average improvement of 4 BLEU points over the previous work. Results of the human evaluation indicate a 47.7 % absolute improvement over the previous work in term translation accuracy when translating into Latvian.', 'pt': 'A maior parte do trabalho recente sobre integração de terminologia na tradução automática assumiu que as traduções de terminologia são dadas já flexionadas em formas adequadas para a sentença do idioma de destino. No trabalho diário de tradutores profissionais, no entanto, raramente acontece quando os tradutores trabalham com glossários bilíngues em que os termos são dados em suas formas de dicionário; encontrar a forma correta do idioma de destino faz parte do processo de tradução. Argumentamos que a exigência de formas de língua-alvo especificadas a priori é irrealista e impede a aplicabilidade prática de trabalhos anteriores. Neste trabalho, propomos treinar sistemas de tradução automática usando um método de aumento de dados do lado da fonte que anota palavras do idioma de origem selecionadas aleatoriamente com seus lemas do idioma de destino. Mostramos que os sistemas treinados com esses dados aumentados são prontamente utilizáveis para integração de terminologia em cenários de tradução da vida real. Nossos experimentos de tradução de terminologia para as línguas morfologicamente complexas bálticas e urálicas mostram uma melhoria de até 7 pontos BLEU em relação aos sistemas de linha de base sem meios para integração de terminologia e uma melhoria média de 4 pontos BLEU em relação ao trabalho anterior. Os resultados da avaliação humana indicam uma melhoria absoluta de 47,7% em relação ao trabalho anterior na precisão da tradução de termos ao traduzir para o letão.', 'es': 'La mayor parte del trabajo reciente sobre la integración terminológica en la traducción automática ha supuesto que las traducciones terminológicas ya se dan flexionadas en formas que son adecuadas para la oración del idioma de destino. Sin embargo, en el trabajo diario de los traductores profesionales rara vez ocurre, ya que los traductores trabajan con glosarios bilingües donde los términos se dan en sus formularios de diccionario; encontrar el idioma de destino correcto forma parte del proceso de traducción. Argumentamos que el requisito de formularios de idioma de destino especificados a priori no es realista e impide la aplicabilidad práctica del trabajo anterior. En este trabajo, proponemos entrenar los sistemas de traducción automática utilizando un método de aumento de datos en el origen que anote palabras del idioma fuente seleccionadas al azar con sus lemas del idioma de destino. Demostramos que los sistemas capacitados en estos datos aumentados se pueden utilizar fácilmente para la integración terminológica en escenarios de traducción de la vida real. Nuestros experimentos sobre la traducción de terminología a los idiomas báltico y urálico morfológicamente complejos muestran una mejora de hasta 7 puntos BLEU con respecto a los sistemas de referencia sin medios para la integración terminológica y una mejora media de 4 puntos BLEU con respecto al trabajo anterior. Los resultados de la evaluación humana indican una mejora absoluta del 47,7% con respecto al trabajo anterior en la precisión de la traducción de términos cuando se traduce al letón.', 'fr': "La plupart des travaux récents sur l'intégration de la terminologie dans la traduction automatique supposent que les traductions terminologiques sont données sous des formes adaptées à la phrase de la langue cible. Dans le travail quotidien des traducteurs professionnels, cependant, c'est rarement le cas, car les traducteurs travaillent avec des glossaires bilingues où les termes sont donnés dans leur forme de dictionnaire\xa0; la recherche de la bonne forme dans la langue cible fait partie du processus de traduction. Nous soutenons que l'exigence de formes de langue cible spécifiées a priori est irréaliste et entrave l'applicabilité pratique des travaux antérieurs. Dans ce travail, nous proposons de former des systèmes de traduction automatique utilisant une méthode d'augmentation des données côté source qui annote des mots de langue source sélectionnés au hasard avec leurs lemmes de langue cible. Nous montrons que les systèmes formés sur ces données augmentées sont facilement utilisables pour l'intégration terminologique dans des scénarios de traduction réels. Nos expériences sur la traduction terminologique dans les langues baltes et ouraliennes morphologiquement complexes montrent une amélioration allant jusqu'à 7 points UEBL par rapport aux systèmes de base sans aucun moyen d'intégration terminologique et une amélioration moyenne de 4 points UEBL par rapport aux travaux précédents. Les résultats de l'évaluation humaine indiquent une amélioration absolue de 47,7\xa0% par rapport aux travaux précédents en termes de précision de la traduction terminologique en letton.", 'ja': '機械翻訳における用語統合に関する最近の研究のほとんどは、用語の翻訳は、ターゲット言語の文章に適した形で既に屈折していると仮定している。 しかし、プロの翻訳者の日常業務では、翻訳者が辞書形式で用語を提供するバイリンガル用語集を使用して作業するため、そのようなことはほとんどありません。適切なターゲット言語形式を見つけることは、翻訳プロセスの一部です。 我々は、apriori指定の対象言語フォームの要件は現実的ではなく、前作の実用性を妨げていると主張する。 この研究では、ランダムに選択されたソース言語の単語にターゲット言語のレマをアノテーションするソース側データ拡張法を使用して、機械翻訳システムをトレーニングすることを提案します。 このような拡張データに関するトレーニングを受けたシステムは、現実の翻訳シナリオの用語統合にすぐに使用できることを示しています。 形態的に複雑なバルト語とウラル語への用語翻訳の実験では、用語統合の手段がなく、ベースラインシステムよりも最大7 BLEUポイント向上し、前作よりも平均4 BLEUポイント向上しました。 人間の評価の結果は、ラトビア語に翻訳すると、用語の翻訳精度が以前の作業よりも47.7%絶対的に改善することを示している。', 'zh': '近世机器翻译中术语集者多假设术语译已以适意词句屈折之。 然专业翻译人员常事,罕有此类,以翻译人员用双语词汇表,术语以字典文出之。 得正言者,译之一也。 余谓优先指定语言不实,且阻前事实适用性。 于此,臣等议用源端数以练机器翻译统,其法用向语引理注随机择源语单词。 我们明白,于此增强数据上训练的系统很容易实用实译场景中的术语集成。 吾于将术语翻译成波罗的海、乌拉尔语之实验,无术语整合术者,基线统增至7 BLEU分,而均增于前4 BLEU分。 人工评结果表明,在翻译成拉脱维亚语时,术语翻译准确性高于前47.7%。', 'ar': 'افترضت معظم الأعمال الحديثة حول تكامل المصطلحات في الترجمة الآلية أن ترجمات المصطلحات قد تم تقديمها بالفعل في أشكال مناسبة لجملة اللغة الهدف. في العمل اليومي للمترجمين المحترفين ، نادرًا ما يكون هذا هو الحال حيث يعمل المترجمون مع المسارد ثنائية اللغة حيث يتم إعطاء المصطلحات في أشكال القاموس الخاصة بهم ؛ يعد العثور على نموذج اللغة الهدف الصحيح جزءًا من عملية الترجمة. نحن نجادل بأن متطلبات أشكال اللغة الهدف المحددة من قبل apriori غير واقعية وتعيق التطبيق العملي للعمل السابق. في هذا العمل ، نقترح تدريب أنظمة الترجمة الآلية باستخدام طريقة زيادة البيانات من جانب المصدر والتي تشرح كلمات لغة المصدر المختارة عشوائيًا باستخدام لغتها المستهدفة lemmas. نظهر أن الأنظمة المدربة على مثل هذه البيانات المعززة قابلة للاستخدام بسهولة لتكامل المصطلحات في سيناريوهات الترجمة الواقعية. تُظهر تجاربنا في ترجمة المصطلحات إلى لغات البلطيق والأورال المعقدة شكليًا تحسنًا يصل إلى 7 نقاط BLEU على أنظمة خط الأساس مع عدم وجود وسيلة لتكامل المصطلحات وتحسين متوسط 4 نقاط BLEU على العمل السابق. تشير نتائج التقييم البشري إلى تحسن مطلق بنسبة 47.7٪ مقارنة بالعمل السابق في دقة ترجمة المصطلحات عند الترجمة إلى اللغة اللاتفية.', 'ru': 'Большая часть недавней работы по терминологической интеграции в машинном переводе предполагает, что терминологические переводы даются уже в формах, подходящих для предложения на целевом языке. Однако в повседневной работе профессиональных переводчиков это редко бывает, поскольку переводчики работают с двуязычными глоссариями, где термины даются в их словарных формах; поиск правильной целевой языковой формы является частью процесса перевода. Мы утверждаем, что требование к априорно заданным целевым языковым формам является нереалистичным и препятствует практической применимости предыдущей работы. В этой работе мы предлагаем обучать системы машинного перевода с использованием метода дополнения данных на стороне источника, который аннотирует случайно выбранные слова исходного языка с их целевыми языковыми лемами. Мы показываем, что системы, обученные таким дополненным данным, легко использовать для интеграции терминологии в реальных сценариях перевода. Наши эксперименты по переводу терминологии на морфологически сложные балтийский и уральский языки показывают улучшение до 7 баллов БЛЮ по сравнению с базовыми системами без средств для терминологической интеграции и среднее улучшение на 4 балла БЛЮ по сравнению с предыдущей работой. Результаты человеческой оценки свидетельствуют об абсолютном улучшении точности перевода на латышский язык на 47,7% по сравнению с предыдущей работой.', 'hi': 'मशीन अनुवाद में शब्दावली एकीकरण पर हाल के अधिकांश काम ने माना है कि शब्दावली अनुवाद पहले से ही उन रूपों में दिए गए हैं जो लक्ष्य भाषा वाक्य के लिए उपयुक्त हैं। पेशेवर अनुवादकों के दिन-प्रतिदिन के काम में, हालांकि, यह शायद ही कभी ऐसा होता है क्योंकि अनुवादक द्विभाषी शब्दावली के साथ काम करते हैं जहां शब्द उनके शब्दकोश रूपों में दिए जाते हैं; सही लक्ष्य भाषा प्रपत्र ढूँढना अनुवाद प्रक्रिया का हिस्सा है। हम तर्क देते हैं कि apriori निर्दिष्ट लक्ष्य भाषा रूपों के लिए आवश्यकता अवास्तविक है और पिछले काम की व्यावहारिक प्रयोज्यता में बाधा डालती है। इस काम में, हम एक स्रोत-साइड डेटा संवर्धन विधि का उपयोग करके मशीन अनुवाद प्रणालियों को प्रशिक्षित करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो यादृच्छिक रूप से चयनित स्रोत भाषा शब्दों को उनके लक्ष्य भाषा लेमा के साथ एनोटेट करता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि इस तरह के संवर्धित डेटा पर प्रशिक्षित सिस्टम वास्तविक जीवन अनुवाद परिदृश्यों में शब्दावली एकीकरण के लिए आसानी से उपयोग करने योग्य हैं। रूपात्मक रूप से जटिल बाल्टिक और यूरालिक भाषाओं में शब्दावली अनुवाद पर हमारे प्रयोगों से बेसलाइन सिस्टम पर 7 BLEU बिंदुओं तक का सुधार दिखाया गया है, जिसमें शब्दावली एकीकरण के लिए कोई साधन नहीं है और पिछले काम पर 4 BLEU बिंदुओं का औसत सुधार है। मानव मूल्यांकन के परिणाम लातवियाई में अनुवाद करते समय शब्द अनुवाद सटीकता में पिछले काम की तुलना में 47.7% पूर्ण सुधार का संकेत देते हैं।', 'ga': 'Glactar leis sa chuid is mó den obair a rinneadh le déanaí ar chomhtháthú téarmaíochta san aistriúchán uathoibríoch go dtugtar aistriúcháin téarmeolaíochta infhillte cheana féin i bhfoirmeacha atá oiriúnach don abairt sprioctheanga. In obair laethúil na n-aistritheoirí gairmiúla, áfach, is annamh a bhíonn sé amhlaidh mar go n-oibríonn aistritheoirí le gluaiseanna dátheangacha ina dtugtar téarmaí ina bhfoclóirí; Is cuid den phróiseas aistriúcháin é an fhoirm cheart sprioctheanga a aimsiú. Áitíonn muid go bhfuil an riachtanas do fhoirmeacha sonraithe sprioctheangacha apriori neamhréadúil agus go gcuireann sé bac ar infheidhmeacht phraiticiúil na hoibre roimhe seo. San obair seo, tá sé beartaithe againn córais aistriúcháin mheaisín a thraenáil trí úsáid a bhaint as modh méadaithe sonraí ó thaobh foinse a chuireann anótáil ar fhocail teanga foinse a roghnaítear go randamach lena gcuid leamaí sprioctheanga. Léirímid go bhfuil córais oilte ar shonraí méadaithe den sórt sin inúsáidte go héasca chun téarmaíocht a chomhtháthú i gcásanna fíor-aistriúcháin. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh ar aistriú téarmaíochta go dtí na teangacha Baltacha agus Úralacha atá casta ó thaobh moirfeolaíochta de, feabhas suas le 7 bpointe BLEU ar chórais bhonnlíne gan aon mhodh chun téarmaíocht a chomhtháthú agus feabhas meánach de 4 phointe BLEU ar an obair roimhe seo. Léiríonn torthaí na meastóireachta daonna feabhas iomlán de 47.7% ar an obair roimhe seo ar chruinneas aistriúcháin téarma nuair a bhítear ag aistriú go Laitvis.', 'hu': 'A gépi fordításban történő terminológiai integrációval kapcsolatos legtöbb közelmúltbeli munka azt feltételezte, hogy a terminológiai fordítások már befolyásolt formákban vannak megadva, amelyek alkalmasak a célnyelvi mondathoz. A hivatásos fordítók mindennapi munkájában azonban ritkán fordul elő, mivel a fordítók kétnyelvű szószedetekkel dolgoznak, ahol a szótár formájában kifejezések szerepelnek; A fordítási folyamat része a megfelelő célnyelvű űrlap megtalálása. Azt állítjuk, hogy az apriori meghatározott célnyelvű formanyomtatványok követelménye irreális és akadályozza a korábbi munkák gyakorlati alkalmazhatóságát. Ebben a munkában a gépi fordítási rendszerek képzését javasoljuk egy forrás-oldali adatbővítési módszer segítségével, amely véletlenszerűen kiválasztott forrásnyelvi szavakat jegyzetel a célnyelvi lemmákkal. Megmutatjuk, hogy az ilyen kiterjesztett adatokra képzett rendszerek könnyen használhatók terminológiai integrációhoz valós fordítási forgatókönyvekben. A morfológiailag összetett balti és uráli nyelvekre történő terminológiai fordítással kapcsolatos kísérleteink a kiindulási rendszerekhez képest akár 7 BLEU ponttal javultak, a terminológiai integráció eszköze nélkül, és az előző munkához képest átlagosan 4 BLEU ponttal javultak. Az emberi értékelés eredményei 47,7%-os abszolút javulást mutatnak az előző munkához képest a kifejezések pontosságában a lett nyelvre történő fordítás során.', 'el': 'Το μεγαλύτερο μέρος των πρόσφατων εργασιών σχετικά με την ενσωμάτωση ορολογίας στη μηχανική μετάφραση έχει υποθέσει ότι οι μεταφράσεις ορολογίας δίνονται ήδη στρεβλωμένες σε μορφές που είναι κατάλληλες για την πρόταση της γλώσσας-στόχου. Στην καθημερινή εργασία των επαγγελματιών μεταφραστών, ωστόσο, σπάνια συμβαίνει καθώς οι μεταφραστές εργάζονται με δίγλωσσα γλωσσάρια όπου οι όροι δίνονται στις φόρμες λεξικού τους. Η εύρεση της σωστής μορφής γλώσσας-στόχου αποτελεί μέρος της μεταφραστικής διαδικασίας. Υποστηρίζουμε ότι η απαίτηση για συγκεκριμένες μορφές γλώσσας στόχου είναι μη ρεαλιστική και εμποδίζει την πρακτική εφαρμογή προηγούμενων εργασιών. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε την εκπαίδευση συστημάτων μηχανικής μετάφρασης χρησιμοποιώντας μια μέθοδο αύξησης δεδομένων στην πλευρά της πηγής που σχολιάζει τυχαία επιλεγμένες λέξεις γλώσσας πηγής με τα λεμώματα της γλώσσας στόχου τους. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι τα συστήματα που εκπαιδεύονται σε τέτοια ενισχυμένα δεδομένα είναι εύκολα χρησιμοποιήσιμα για την ενσωμάτωση ορολογίας σε πραγματικά σενάρια μετάφρασης. Τα πειράματα μας για τη μετάφραση ορολογίας στις μορφολογικά πολύπλοκες Βαλτικές και Ουραλικές γλώσσες δείχνουν βελτίωση έως και 7 σημείων σε σχέση με τα συστήματα βάσης χωρίς μέσα ενσωμάτωσης ορολογίας και μέση βελτίωση των 4 σημείων σε σχέση με την προηγούμενη εργασία. Τα αποτελέσματα της ανθρώπινης αξιολόγησης δείχνουν 47,7% απόλυτη βελτίωση σε σχέση με την προηγούμενη εργασία όσον αφορά την ακρίβεια της μετάφρασης όρων κατά τη μετάφραση στα λετονικά.', 'ka': 'ბოლო ტერმინოლოგიის ინტერგრაციაში მაქსინის შეტყობინებაში უფრო აღმოჩენა, რომ ტერმინოლოგიის შეტყობინება უკვე ინტერფექტირებულია ფორმებში, რომლებიც მისაწყ პროფეციალური ტრანსტრალიტორის ყოველდღე სამუშაოში, მაგრამ ეს ცოტა, როგორც ტრანსტრალიტორი მუშაობენ ორიენგური სიტყვებით, სადაც სამუშაო სიტყვების ფორმა მართლა მიზეზი ენის ფორმა ძებნა არის გადაწყვეტილების პროცესის ნაწილი. ჩვენ არჩევით, რომ აპრიორის განსაზღვრებული მინიშვნელოვანი ენის ფორმებისთვის მოჭირდება არიან და წინა სამუშაო პრაქტიკური აპლექტირება. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ მინდომებით მანქანის გარგზავნა სისტემების გარგზავნა, რომელიც სამუშაოდ გამოყენებული მონაცემების აგგენტირება მეტის გამოყენება, რომელიც გამო ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ასეთი ადგენტირებული მონაცემების სისტემები ტერმინოლოგიის ინტერგურაციისთვის გამოყენებელია რეალური ცხოვრების სინარიოში. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები ტერმინოლოგიის შეცვლის მოპროლოგიურად კომპლექსიურად ბალიტიკურად და სურალიკურად ენაში ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები აჩვენებს 7 BLEU წერტილების შესაძლებლობა ბაზლინის სისტემაში, რომე ადამიანის განსაზღვრების შედეგები აჩვენებენ 47,7% აბსოლუტური უფლება წინა სამუშაო სამუშაოში, როდესაც ლატვიანურად გადაწყენება.', 'kk': 'Компьютердің аудармасында терминология интеграциясының жаңа жұмысының көпшілігі терминология аудармасының алдында мақсатты тіл сөздеріне қолданылатын пішімдерінде әсер етеді деп ой Бірақ күнделік күнделік аудармаларының жұмысында, олар әлемдегі сөздік пішімдерінде терминдер берілген сөздік сөздіктерінде жұмыс істейтін қызықты болады. Оң мақсатты тіл пішімін табу - аудару процесінің бөлігі. Біз apriori келтірілген мақсатты тіл пішімдерінің қажеттігі нереалистикалық және алдыңғы жұмыстың практикалық қолдануға болады деп айтып тұрмыз. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз компьютерді аудару жүйелерін көздегі деректерді қосу әдісін қолдануға ұсынып, кездейсоқ таңдалған көздегі тілдер сөздерін мақсатты тілдерінің лиммасынан тү Біз бұл көбейтілген деректерге оқылған жүйелер шын өмірдің аудару сценариясында терминология интеграциясы үшін оңай қолданылады деп көрсетедік. Терминологиялық аудармаларды морфологиялық және ураллық тілдерге аудару тәжірибелеріміз терминологиялық интеграциясы және алдыңғы жұмыс ішінде 4 BLEU нүктелерін жақсарту үшін 7 BLEU нүктелеріне дейін жақсарту көр Адам оқиғасының нәтижесі Латвияға аударғанда, алдыңғы жұмыс бойынша 47,7% абсолютті жақсарту дегенді көрсетеді.', 'it': "La maggior parte dei recenti lavori sull'integrazione terminologica nella traduzione automatica ha ipotizzato che le traduzioni terminologiche siano già fornite in forme adatte alla frase della lingua di destinazione. Nel lavoro quotidiano dei traduttori professionisti, tuttavia, è raro che i traduttori lavorino con glossari bilingui in cui i termini sono riportati nei loro moduli di dizionario; Trovare la lingua di destinazione giusta fa parte del processo di traduzione. Sosteniamo che il requisito per i moduli di lingua di destinazione apriori specificati è irrealistico e impedisce l'applicabilità pratica di lavori precedenti. In questo lavoro, proponiamo di formare sistemi di traduzione automatica utilizzando un metodo di aumento dei dati lato sorgente che annota parole della lingua sorgente selezionate casualmente con i loro lemmi della lingua di destinazione. Mostriamo che i sistemi formati su tali dati aumentati sono facilmente utilizzabili per l'integrazione terminologica in scenari di traduzione reali. I nostri esperimenti sulla traduzione terminologica nelle lingue morfologicamente complesse baltiche e uraliche mostrano un miglioramento fino a 7 punti BLEU rispetto ai sistemi di base senza mezzi di integrazione terminologica e un miglioramento medio di 4 punti BLEU rispetto al lavoro precedente. I risultati della valutazione umana indicano un miglioramento assoluto del 47,7% rispetto al lavoro precedente in termini di accuratezza della traduzione dei termini durante la traduzione in lettone.", 'lt': 'Dauguma neseniai atliktų darbų, susijusių su terminologijos integracija mašin ų vertimuose, manė, kad terminologijos vertimai jau pateikiami formomis, tinkamomis tiksliniam kalbos sakiniui. Vis dėlto profesionalių vertėjų kasdieniame darbe tai retai daroma, nes vertėjai dirba dvikalbiais žodynais, kai žodyno formomis pateikiami terminai; surasti tinkamą tikslinę kalbą yra vertimo proceso dalis. Mes teigiame, kad apriorų nurodytų tikslinių kalbų formų reikalavimas yra nerealistiškas ir trukdo praktiškai taikyti ankstesnį darbą. Šiame darbe siūlome treniruoti mašinų vertimo sistemas naudojant šaltinio duomenų didinimo metodą, kuris atsitiktinai pasirinktus šaltinio kalbos žodžius anotuoja jų tikslinėmis kalbomis lemmomis. Mes rodome, kad tokiais padidintais duomenimis parengtos sistemos lengvai gali būti naudojamos terminologijai integruoti į realiojo gyvenimo vertimo scenarijus. Mūsų eksperimentai dėl terminologijos vertimo į morfologiškai sudėtingas Baltijos ir Uralo kalbas rodo, kad iki 7 BLEU taškų pagerėjimas palyginti su pradinėmis sistemomis be jokių terminologijos integracijos priemonių ir vidutinis 4 BLEU taškų pagerėjimas palyginti su ankstesniu darbu. Results of the human evaluation indicate a 47.7% absolute improvement over the previous work in term translation accuracy when translating into Latvian.', 'mk': 'Поголемиот дел од неодамнешната работа за интеграција на терминологијата во машинскиот превод претпоставува дека терминолошките преводи се даваат веќе во форми кои се соодветни за реченицата на јазикот на целта. Сепак, во секојдневната работа на професионалните преведувачи, ретко е случајот кога преведувачите работат со двојјазични глосари каде што термините се дадени во нивните форма на речник; пронаоѓањето на вистинскиот јазик на метата е дел од процесот на превод. Ние тврдиме дека барањето за специфицираните форми на јазик на пририори е нереално и ја попречува практичната апликабилност на претходната работа. Во оваа работа предлагаме да ги обучуваме машинските преведувачки системи користејќи метод за зголемување на податоците од страната на изворот кој ги анотира случајно избраните зборови на изворот јазик со нивните лимани на јазикот на целта. Ние покажуваме дека системите обучени на вакви зголемени податоци се лесно употребливи за интеграција на терминологијата во реалните сценарија за превод. Нашите експерименти за терминолошки превод на морфолошки комплексни балтички и уралички јазици покажуваат подобрување од до 7 БЛЕ поени во однос на основните системи без средства за терминолошка интеграција и просечно подобрување од 4 БЛЕ поени во однос на претходната работа. Резултатите од човечката проценка покажуваат апсолутно подобрување од 47,7 отсто во однос на претходната работа во однос на точноста на терминскиот превод кога се преведува на латонски.', 'ml': 'മെഷിന്\u200d പരിഭാഷയില്\u200d ടെര്\u200dമിനോളജിയുടെ ഒരുമിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും അടുത്ത പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളില്\u200d മിക്കവാറും വിചാരിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു ട ഇന്ന് ദിവസം പ്രൊഫഷണല്\u200d പരിഭാഷക്കാരുടെ ജോലിയിലാണ്, എന്നാലും പരിഭാഷകന്\u200dമാര്\u200d രണ്ടു ഭാഷക്കുള്ള ഗ്ലാസ്സറുകളുമായി ജോലി ചെയ്യുന് ശരിയായ ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്റെ ഭാഷ കണ്ടെത്തുന്നത് പരിഭാഷപ്രക്രിയയുടെ ഭാഗമാണ്. നമ്മള്\u200d വാദിക്കുന്നത് ആപ്രിറിയിയില്\u200d വ്യക്തമായ ലക്ഷ്യ രീതികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ആവശ്യം അധികാരികമാണെന്നും മുമ്പ് ജോലിയു ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ സിസ്റ്റം പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. സോര്\u200dസ്- side ഡേറ്റാ അഗ്മെന്റേഷന്\u200d രീ ഇങ്ങനെയുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200d ശരിക്കും ജീവിതത്തിലെ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d ടെര്\u200dമിനോളജി ഒരുമിച ടെര്\u200dമിനിലോളജി പരിഭാഷണത്തില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ബാള്\u200dട്ടിക്കും ഉരാലിക്ക് ഭാഷകളിലേക്കും പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നത് 7 ബിലിയു പോയിന്\u200dറ ലാത്വിയനിലേക്ക് പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുമ്പോള്\u200d മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലിയില്\u200d 47. 7% മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു.', 'ms': 'Kebanyakan kerja baru-baru ini mengenai integrasi terminologi dalam terjemahan mesin telah menganggap terjemahan terminologi telah diberikan dalam bentuk yang sesuai untuk kalimat bahasa sasaran. Dalam kerja sehari-hari penerjemah profesional, bagaimanapun, ia jarang berlaku sebagai penerjemah bekerja dengan glossari dua bahasa di mana terma diberikan dalam bentuk kamus mereka; cari bentuk bahasa sasaran yang betul adalah sebahagian dari proses terjemahan. Kami menyangka bahawa keperluan untuk bentuk bahasa sasaran yang dinyatakan apriori tidak realistik dan menghalangi kemudahan praktik kerja terdahulu. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan untuk melatih sistem terjemahan mesin menggunakan kaedah peningkatan data sisi-sumber yang menyatakan perkataan bahasa sumber terpilih secara rawak dengan lemma bahasa sasaran mereka. Kami menunjukkan bahawa sistem dilatih pada data bertambah tersebut mudah digunakan untuk integrasi terminologi dalam skenario terjemahan nyata. Our experiments on terminology translation into the morphologically complex Baltic and Uralic languages show an improvement of up to 7 BLEU points over baseline systems with no means for terminology integration and an average improvement of 4 BLEU points over the previous work.  Hasil penilaian manusia menunjukkan penambahan mutlak 47.7% daripada kerja sebelumnya dalam ketepatan terjemahan term a apabila diterjemahkan ke Latvia.', 'mt': 'Il-biċċa l-kbira tax-xogħol riċenti dwar l-integrazzjoni tat-terminoloġija fit-traduzzjoni bil-magni jassumi li t-traduzzjonijiet tat-terminoloġija diġà jingħataw f’forom li huma adattati għas-sentenza fil-lingwa fil-mira. Madankollu, fil-ħidma ta’ kuljum tat-tradutturi professjonali, rarament ikun il-każ peress li t-tradutturi jaħdmu bil-glossarji bilingwi fejn it-termini jingħataw fil-forom tad-dikjarazzjoni tagħhom; is-sejba tal-formola tal-lingwa fil-mira tajba hija parti mill-proċess tat-traduzzjoni. Aħna jargumentaw li r-rekwiżit għal forom lingwistiċi fil-mira speċifikati fl-apriori mhuwiex realistiku u jfixkel l-applikabbiltà prattika tax-xogħol preċedenti. F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nipproponu li nħarrġu sistemi ta’ traduzzjoni tal-magni bl-użu ta’ metodu ta’ żieda tad-dejta min-naħa tas-sors li jinnota kliem tas-sors magħżul b’mod każwali bil-limmi tal-lingwa fil-mira tagħhom. Aħna nuru li sistemi mħarrġa fuq dejta miżjuda bħal din jistgħu jintużaw faċilment għall-integrazzjoni tat-terminoloġija fix-xenarji tat-traduzzjoni tal-ħajja reali. L-esperimenti tagħna dwar it-traduzzjoni tat-terminoloġija fil-lingwi Baltiċi u Urali morfoloġikament kumplessi juru titjib sa 7 punti BLEU fuq is-sistemi ta’ referenza mingħajr mezzi għall-integrazzjoni tat-terminoloġija u titjib medju ta’ 4 punti BLEU fuq ix-xogħol preċedenti. Ir-riżultati tal-evalwazzjoni umana jindikaw titjib assolut ta’ 47.7% fuq ix-xogħol preċedenti fil-preċiżjoni tat-traduzzjoni fit-terminu meta jiġi tradott fil-Latvjan.', 'pl': 'Większość ostatnich prac nad integracją terminologii w tłumaczeniu maszynowym zakłada, że tłumaczenia terminologiczne są już podawane w formach odpowiednich dla zdania języka docelowego. Jednakże w codziennej pracy profesjonalnych tłumaczy rzadko jest tak, ponieważ tłumacze pracują z dwujęzycznymi słownikami, w których terminy są podawane w ich formach słownikowych; Znalezienie odpowiedniej formy języka docelowego jest częścią procesu tłumaczenia. Twierdzimy, że wymóg dotyczący określonych form języka docelowego jest nierealny i utrudnia praktyczne zastosowanie poprzednich prac. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy szkolenie systemów tłumaczeń maszynowych przy użyciu metody powiększania danych po stronie źródła, która adnotacja losowo wybranych słów języka źródłowego z ich lemmami języka docelowego. Pokazujemy, że systemy przeszkolone na takich rozszerzonych danych są łatwo wykorzystywane do integracji terminologii w rzeczywistych scenariuszach tłumaczeniowych. Nasze eksperymenty dotyczące tłumaczenia terminologii na złożone morfologicznie języki bałtyckie i uralskie wykazują poprawę do 7 punktów BLEU w stosunku do systemów bazowych bez możliwości integracji terminologii oraz średnią poprawę 4 punktów BLEU w stosunku do poprzednich prac. Wyniki oceny ludzkiej wskazują na 47,7% bezwzględną poprawę dokładności tłumaczenia terminów w porównaniu z poprzednimi pracami.', 'ro': 'Cele mai multe dintre lucrările recente privind integrarea terminologiei în traducerea automată au presupus că traducerile terminologice sunt oferite deja în forme care sunt adecvate pentru propoziția în limba țintă. Cu toate acestea, în activitatea de zi cu zi a traducătorilor profesioniști, este rareori cazul în care traducătorii lucrează cu glosare bilingve în care termenii sunt menționați în formularele lor de dicționar; găsirea formularului de limbă țintă corect face parte din procesul de traducere. Susținem că cerința pentru formularele specifice limbii țintă apriori este nerealistă și împiedică aplicabilitatea practică a lucrărilor anterioare. În această lucrare, propunem instruirea sistemelor de traducere automată utilizând o metodă de augmentare a datelor sursă, care adnotează cuvintele din limba sursă selectate aleatoriu cu lemmele limbii lor țintă. Noi arătăm că sistemele instruite pe astfel de date augmentate sunt ușor de utilizat pentru integrarea terminologică în scenariile de traducere din viața reală. Experimentele noastre privind traducerea terminologică în limbile baltice și uralice complexe morfologic arată o îmbunătățire de până la 7 puncte BLEU față de sistemele de bază fără mijloace de integrare terminologică și o îmbunătățire medie de 4 puncte BLEU față de lucrările anterioare. Rezultatele evaluării umane indică o îmbunătățire absolută de 47,7% față de lucrările anterioare în ceea ce privește acuratețea traducerii termenilor atunci când traduceți în letonă.', 'mn': 'Машин орчуулалтын терминологийн нэгтгэл дээрх саяхан ажиллагааны ихэнх нь терминологийн орчуулалтыг зориулагдсан хэлний өгүүллийг ашиглах боломжтой хэлбэрээр нөлөөлдөг гэдгийг ойлгосон. Гэхдээ өдөр тутам мэргэжлийн орчуулагчдын ажлын хувьд орчуулагчид хоёр хэл үг хэлний хэлбэрээр ажиллаж байгаа юм. зөв зорилготой хэл хэлбэрийг олох нь орчуулах процессын нэг хэсэг юм. Бид тайлбарласан зорилготой хэл хэлбэрүүдийн шаардлага нь буруу болон өмнөх ажлын практикийн хэрэгцээг зогсоож чадахгүй гэдгийг хэлж байна. Энэ ажлын тулд бид машин орчуулах системүүдийг эх үүсвэрийн өгөгдлийн нэмэлт арга ашиглаж, санамсаргүй сонгогдсон эх хэл үгийг тэдний зорилготой хэл лиммаасаар зааж өгдөг. Бид ийм нэмэгдсэн өгөгдлийн талаар сургалтын систем бодит амьдралын орчуулалтын хувилбарт терминологийн нэгтгэлийн тулд амархан хэрэглэгддэг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бидний терминологийг морфологик болон уралик хэлнүүд рүү хөгжүүлэх туршилтуудын туршилт нь өмнөх ажил дээр 4 БЛЕУ цэгүүдийн дундаж нэмэгдүүлэх боломжгүй 7 БЛЕУ цэгүүдийг багасгаж байна. Хүн төрөлхтний оюутнуудын үр дүнд Латвийн хэлбэрт орчуулахад 47.7% нь өмнөх ажлын хувьсалын тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолтыг илэрхийлж байна.', 'no': 'Dei fleste av dei siste arbeida på terminologisk integrering i maskineomsetjinga har anta at terminologiske omsetjingar er allereie påvirka i formar som er passande for målspråsetjinga. I daglige arbeid av profesjonelle translatorer er det likevel ofte tilfellet som translatorer arbeider med bilinguelt glossarar der vilkår vert gitt i ordbokforma sine. å finna det rette målspråkformatet er ein del av omsetjingsprosessen. Vi argumenterer at krevet for apriori spesifiserte målspråkformar er uleistisk og hindrar praktiske tilgjengelighet for tidlegare arbeid. I denne arbeida foreslår vi å trenja maskineoversettelsystemet med ein metode for økning av kjeldesidedata som merkar tilfeldig valde kjeldespråk med dei målspråkslemma. Vi viser at systemet trent på slike augmenterte data er lett brukbart for terminologiske integrasjon i verkeleg oversettelsscenarioar. Våre eksperimenter om terminologisk omsetjing til morfologisk komplekse baltiske og Uralske språk viser en forbedring av opp til 7 BLEU-punkt over grunnlinjesystemet med ingen måte for terminologisk integrering og gjennomsnittlig forbedring av 4 BLEU-punkt over tidlegare arbeid. Resultatet av menneskelige evalueringa tyder på at ein absolutt forbedring av 47,7 % over det førre arbeidet i uttrykket for omsetjing når det vert omsett til latinsk.', 'si': 'යන්ත්\u200dරය භාවිතයේ අන්තිම විශේෂය සම්බන්ධ විදියට අන්තිම වැඩේ ගොඩක් අන්තිම විදියට අවශ්\u200dය භාවිතයේ භාවිතයේ භ ව්\u200dයාපාරිත්මක වාර්තාවක් ගැන දවස් දවස් වැඩේ තියෙනවා, ඒත්, ඒක ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙන් වාර්තාවක් වැඩ කරනවා වගේම දෙවස් භාෂාවක් වල හරියට ලක්ෂණ භාෂාව හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් භාෂාවේ කොටසක්. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ඇප්\u200dරියෝරි විශ්වාස කරපු ලක්ෂණ භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැහැ කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන් මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා මෙෂින් වාර්ථාව පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට පරික අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ඒ වගේ විශාලනය කරපු පද්ධතිය ලේසියෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට තර්මින්ත්\u200dරවේෂය ස අපේ පරීක්ෂණය තාර්මාණික විවෘත්තියේ මොර්ෆෝලෝජික සංශ්\u200dය බැල්ටික් සහ උරාලික් භාෂාවට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්නේ බිල්යුස් 7 පැයින මිනිස්සු විශ්ලේෂණයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ ලැට්වියාන් වලට වාර්තාවෙන්න වෙලාවට 47.7% ප්\u200dරතිචාර විශ්ලේ', 'sr': 'Većina nedavnog rada o integraciji terminologije u prevodu mašine pretpostavila je da su prevodi terminologije već uticali na forme koje su odgovarajuće za rečenicu ciljnog jezika. Međutim, u svakodnevnom radu profesionalnih prevodioca, rijetko je slučaj kada prevodioci rade sa dvojezičkim rečenicama gde se uslovi daju u obliku rečenika; Pronaći pravi oblik jezika je deo procesa prevođenja. Tvrdimo da je zahtev za određene oblike ciljnog jezika apriori nerealistan i sprječava praktičnu primjenu prethodnog rada. U ovom poslu predlažemo da treniramo sisteme prevođenja mašina koristeći metodu povećanja podataka iz izvora koji navodi slučajno izražene jezičke reči sa svojim ciljnim jezičkim limama. Pokazujemo da su sistemi obučeni na takvim povećanim podacima lako korisni za integraciju terminologije u scenarijima prevođenja stvarnog života. Naši eksperimenti o prevodu terminologije na morfološki kompleksni baltski i Uralički jezici pokazuju poboljšanje do 7 BLEU bodova na početnim sistemima bez sredstava za integraciju terminologije i prosječno poboljšanje 4 BLEU bodova na prethodnom poslu. Rezultati procjene ljudske procjene ukazuju na apsolutno poboljšanje 47,7% tokom prethodnog rada u terminalnoj preciznosti prevoda kada se prevodi na latinski.', 'sv': 'Det mesta av det senaste arbetet med terminologiintegration i maskin철vers채ttning har utg책tt fr책n att terminologi철vers채ttningar redan ges influerade i former som l채mpar sig f철r m책lspr책kets mening. I det dagliga arbetet med professionella 철vers채ttare 채r det dock s채llan s책, eftersom 철vers채ttare arbetar med tv책spr책kiga ordlistor d채r termer anges i deras ordlistor. Att hitta r채tt m책lspr책ksformul채r 채r en del av 철vers채ttningsprocessen. Vi h채vdar att kravet p책 apriorispecificerade m책lspr책ksformer 채r orealistiskt och hindrar den praktiska till채mpningen av tidigare arbeten. I detta arbete f철resl책r vi att man utbildar maskin철vers채ttningssystem med hj채lp av en dataf철rst채rkningsmetod p책 k채llsidan som kommenterar slumpm채ssigt utvalda k채llspr책ksord med sina m책lspr책kslemmor. Vi visar att system utbildade p책 s책dana ut철kade data l채tt kan anv채ndas f철r terminologiintegration i verkliga 철vers채ttningsscenarier. V책ra experiment med terminologi철vers채ttning till de morfologiskt komplexa baltiska och uraliska spr책ken visar en f철rb채ttring p책 upp till 7 BLEU-po채ng j채mf철rt med baslinjesystem utan medel f철r terminologiintegration och en genomsnittlig f철rb채ttring p책 4 BLEU-po채ng j채mf철rt med f철reg책ende arbete. Resultaten av den m채nskliga utv채rderingen indikerar en absolut f철rb채ttring p책 47,7% j채mf철rt med f철reg책ende arbete i term철vers채ttningens noggrannhet vid 철vers채ttning till lettiska.', 'so': 'Shaqoda ugu dambeysay ee la qabsashada terminology ee turjumidda machine waxay ka fikirtay in turjumaadda terminology ay horay u saameysan yihiin foomka ku habboon luqada goanka ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee shaqo la xiriira xirfadaha maalin kasta waxaa la xiriiraa marka turjubaanadu ay ku shaqeeyaan sharciga labada luqadood, kuwaas oo lagu sharraxay foomka luuqadooda; si aad u hesho foomka saxda ah oo afka goalka ah waa qeyb ka mid ah baaritaanka turjumista. Waxaynu ka sheegaynaa in baahida afka lagu diyaariyey uu yahay mid aan la akhriyeyn karo oo uu ka hor dhigo habka shaqada ee hore. Markaas waxan shaqada, waxaan horumarinaynaa in aan ku tababarinno nidaamka turjumaadda machine-ka isticmaalka qaababka kordhiska macluumaadka dhinaca ah, kaas oo si fudud ugu tababarida hadalka luuqada ah oo la doortay afkooda afka loogu talagalay. Waxaynu muujinnaa in nidaamka lagu tababariyey macluumaadkaas oo la kordhiyey ay si fudud ugu isticmaalaan la qabsashada terminology si ay u isticmaalaan arimaha turjumaadda nolosha ee dhabta ah. Imtixaanka turjumista terminology ee ku qoran luqadaha Morphologi oo murugaysan oo Baltic iyo Uralika ah waxay muuqataa hagaajinta ugu badnaanta ilaa 7 BLEU goobaha kooxaha qoraalka hoose ee nidaamka qoraalka lagu qoray, sababo la qabsashada terminology iyo hagaajinta ugu badnaanta 4 BLEU goobaha shaqadii hore. Qiimeynta dadku waxay ka muuqataa 47.7% oo dhamaan hagaajinta shaqadii hore si saxda ah marka lagu turjumo Latvian.', 'ta': 'கணினி மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் அண்மையியல் ஒன்றிணைப்பதில் பெரும்பாலான வேலை நினைத்துள்ளது முனைனலி மொழிமாற்றிகள் ஏற்கனவே பாதிக்கப்பட்ட தொழில் மொழிமாற்றி மொழிமாற்றிகளின் வேலை இன்று நாள், ஆனால் மொழிபெயர்ப்பாளர்கள் இரு மொழிகளில் வேலை செய்வது குறைந்ததாக இருந்தா சரியான இலக்கு மொழி வடிவத்தை கண்டுபிடிப்பது மொழிபெயர்ப்பு செயல்பாட்டின் பகுதியாகும். குறிப்பிட்ட இலக்கு மொழி வடிவங்களுக்கான தேவைகள் படிக்க இயலாது மற்றும் முந்தைய வேலையின் செயல் பயன்பாட்டை தடுக்கிறத இந்த வேலையில், நாம் கணினி மொழிபெயர்ப்பு அமைப்புகளை பயிற்சி செய்ய முறைமையை பயன்படுத்தும் மூலம்- side data augmentation method which randomly selected source language words with their target language lemmas. இத்தகைய மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட தகவல்களில் பயிற்சியுள்ள அமைப்புகள் எளிதாக முறைநிறைவூட்டத்திற்கு பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது உண்ம முனைய மொழிமாற்றி மொழிபெயர்ப்பிலும் சிக்கலான பால்டிக் மற்றும் Uralic மொழிகளிலும் எங்கள் பரிசோதனைகள் 7 பிலியு புள்ளிகளுக்கு மேல் அதிகரிக்கப்பட்டது முன்னோட்டத்தி மனித மதிப்பின் முடிவு', 'ur': 'ماشین ترجمہ میں ترمینلوژی کا اکثر اگلوں کا کام مطلب ہوا ہے کہ ترمینلوژی ترجمہ پہلے سے فرموں میں اثرات کی جاتی ہے جو موجود زبان جماعت کے لئے مناسب ہیں۔ لیکن روزہ کے روزہ تعلیم کرنے والوں کے کام میں یہ بہت کم ہے جیسے ترجمہ کرنے والوں کو دو زبان کلیسوں کے ساتھ کام کرتا ہے جہاں شرایط ان کے کلیسوں کی شکل میں دی جاتی ہیں۔ ٹھیک موجود زبان کا فرم تلاش کرنا ترجمہ پرسس کا حصہ ہے۔ ہم argue that the requirement for apriori specified target language forms is unrealistic and impedes the practical application of previous work. اس کام میں، ہم نے ماشین ترجمہ سیستموں کو ایک سورس-سائڈ ڈاٹ افزایش طریقہ کے مطابق ترجمہ کرنے کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جو ان کی موجود زبان لیمز کے ساتھ randomly selected source language words annotate کرتا ہے. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایسے افزایش دیٹے پر آموزش کی سیستمات واقعی زندگی کی ترجمہ سناریوں میں ترمینلوژی انگلیسی کے لئے آسان طور پر استعمال کر سکتے ہیں۔ ہمارے ترمینلوژی ترجمہ کی تجربیات کے بارے میں مورفولوژیکی پیچیدہ بالٹیکی اور اورالیک زبانوں میں 7 بلیوس پوینٹوں کی زیادتی کی نشان دیتے ہیں جن میں کوئی ترمینلوژی ترجمہ کرنے کے لئے اور پہلے کاروں پر 4 بلیوس پوینٹوں کی متوسط زیادتی نہیں ہے۔ انسان کی ارزیابی کا نتیجہ لٹوین کی طرف مترجم ہونے کے بعد 47.7% کی مطلوب عملہ کے ذریعہ مزید اضافہ کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Name @ info: whatsthis tarjima jarayonining birinchi qismi. Biz murakkab qilamiz, apriori koʻrsatilgan target tilning shakllari haqida oʻxshash emas va oldingi ish qobiliyatini ishga tayyorlaydi. In this work, we propose to train machine translation systems using a source-side data augmentation method that annotates randomly selected source language words with their target language lemmas.  Biz shunday ko'rsatish tizimlarda o'rganilgan tizimlar haqiqiqiy hayot tarjima zonarida terminologiya birlashtirish uchun oddiy foydalanadi. Terminologiya tarjimalarida murakkablik Baltik va Uralik tillariga o'rganish imtiyozlarimizni birinchi marta 7 BLEU tizimga o'zgartiradi. Terminologiya birlashtirish uchun emas va oldingi ish bilan 4 BLEU qismini o'zgartiradi. Inson qiymatlari natijalari Latviyaga tarjima qilinganda oldingi ish haqida 47.7% yaxshi o'zgarishni oshirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Phần lớn công việc gần đây về việc tổng hợp các thuật ngữ trong phiên dịch cỗ máy cho rằng đã có dịch thuật ngữ sẵn sàng nhập vào các dạng thích hợp cho câu chữ đích. Trong công việc thường ngày của dịch viên chuyên nghiệp, nhưng hiếm khi dịch viên làm việc với từ điển hai chữ, nơi mà có các chữ cái trong đơn từ điển của họ. việc tìm ra ngôn ngữ đúng là một phần của quá trình dịch chuyển. Chúng tôi cho rằng yêu cầu về ngôn ngữ chính xác là không thực tế và cản trở sự tồn tại của những việc trước đây. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị huấn luyện hệ thống dịch chuyển máy bằng một phương pháp gia tăng dữ liệu từ nguồn mà ghi chú những từ ngôn ngữ ngẫu nhiên được chọn với các lemmmas của họ. Chúng tôi cho thấy những hệ thống được huấn luyện dựa trên dữ liệu gia tăng này rất dễ có thể sử dụng cho việc hòa nhập thuật ngữ trong các viễn cảnh dịch thật. Các thí nghiệm về thuật ngữ biến vào ngôn ngữ Baltic và Uralic, chúng tôi thấy có một sự cải tiến trên cả 7 Tại Tổ Chức với hệ thống cơ bản mà không có phương pháp tổng hợp các thuật ngữ học và một cải tiến trung bình của 4 liên quan đến công việc trước. Kết quả của đánh giá con người cho thấy có độ cải thiện tuyệt đối với công việc trước trong việc chuyển chính xác trong ngữ hạn khi chuyển thành người Latvia.', 'nl': "Het merendeel van de recente werkzaamheden op het gebied van terminologie-integratie in machinevertaling is ervan uitgegaan dat terminologie-vertalingen al geïnfecteerd worden gegeven in vormen die geschikt zijn voor de doeltaalzin. In het dagelijkse werk van professionele vertalers is dit echter zelden het geval omdat vertalers werken met tweetalige woordenlijsten waar termen in hun woordenboekformulieren worden vermeld; Het vinden van de juiste doeltaalvorm maakt deel uit van het vertaalproces. Wij stellen dat de eis voor apriori gespecificeerde doeltaalvormen onrealistisch is en de praktische toepasbaarheid van eerder werk belemmert. In dit werk stellen we voor om machine translation systemen te trainen met behulp van een bron-side data augmentation methode die willekeurig geselecteerde brontaalwoorden annotaeert met hun doeltaallemma's. We laten zien dat systemen die zijn getraind op dergelijke augmented data, gemakkelijk bruikbaar zijn voor terminologie-integratie in real-life vertaalscenario's. Onze experimenten met terminologie vertaling in de morfologisch complexe Baltische en Oerale talen tonen een verbetering van maximaal 7 BLEU punten ten opzichte van baseline systemen zonder middelen voor terminologie integratie en een gemiddelde verbetering van 4 BLEU punten ten opzichte van het vorige werk. De resultaten van de menselijke evaluatie wijzen op een absolute verbetering van 47,7% ten opzichte van het vorige werk in termen vertaalnauwkeurigheid bij het vertalen naar het Lets.", 'da': 'Det meste af det seneste arbejde med terminologiintegration i maskinoversættelse har antaget, at terminologioversættelser allerede gives i form, der passer til målsprogets sætning. I det daglige arbejde med professionelle oversættere er det imidlertid sjældent tilfældet, da oversættere arbejder med tosprogede ordlister, hvor termer er angivet i deres ordbogsformularer. At finde den rigtige målsprogsformular er en del af oversættelsesprocessen. Vi hævder, at kravet om apriorispecificerede målsprogsformularer er urealistisk og hindrer den praktiske anvendelighed af tidligere arbejde. I dette arbejde foreslår vi at træne maskinoversættelsessystemer ved hjælp af en kildeside data augmentation metode, der annoterer tilfældigt udvalgte kildesprogsord med deres målsprog lemmaer. Vi viser, at systemer, der er trænet på sådanne forstærkede data, er let anvendelige til terminologiintegration i virkelige oversættelsesscenarier. Vores eksperimenter med terminologioversættelse til de morfologisk komplekse baltiske og uralske sprog viser en forbedring på op til 7 BLEU point i forhold til basissystemer uden midler til terminologiintegration og en gennemsnitlig forbedring på 4 BLEU point i forhold til det tidligere arbejde. Resultaterne af den menneskelige evaluering indikerer en absolut forbedring på 47,7% i forhold til det tidligere arbejde i termoversættelsesnøjagtighed ved oversættelse til lettisk.', 'hr': 'Većina nedavnog rada o integraciji terminologije u prevodu strojeva pretpostavila je da su prevodi terminologije već utjecani na oblike koje su odgovarajuće za rečenicu ciljnog jezika. Međutim, u svakodnevnom radu profesionalnih prevodioca, rijetko je slučaj jer prevodioci rade sa dvojezičkim glossarima gdje se uvjeti daju u svojim oblicima riječi; Pronaći pravi oblik jezika je dio procesa prevođenja. Tvrdimo da je zahtjev za određene oblike ciljnog jezika apriori nerealistan i sprječava praktičnu primjenu prethodnog rada. U ovom poslu predlažemo trenirati sustave prevođenja strojeva koristeći metodu povećanja podataka iz izvora koji navodi slučajno izabrane riječi izvornog jezika sa svojim ciljnim jezičkim limama. Pokazujemo da su sustavi obučeni na takvim povećanim podacima lako korišteni za integraciju terminologije u scenarijima prevođenja stvarnog života. Naši eksperimenti o prevodu terminologije na morfološki kompleksni baltski i Uralički jezici pokazuju poboljšanje do 7 BLEU bodova na početnim sustavima bez načina za integraciju terminologije i prosječno poboljšanje 4 BLEU bodova na prethodnom radu. Rezultati procjene ljudske procjene ukazuju na apsolutno poboljšanje 47,7% tijekom prethodnog rada u terminalnoj preciznosti prevoda kada se prevodi na latinski.', 'de': 'Die meisten Arbeiten zur Terminologieentegration in der maschinellen Übersetzung gehen davon aus, dass Terminologienübersetzungen bereits gebeugt in Formen erfolgen, die für den Zielsprachesatz geeignet sind. In der täglichen Arbeit professioneller Übersetzer ist dies jedoch selten der Fall, da Übersetzer mit zweisprachigen Glossaren arbeiten, in denen Begriffe in ihren Wörterbuchformen angegeben werden; Das Finden der richtigen Zielsprache ist Teil des Übersetzungsprozesses. Wir argumentieren, dass die Anforderung an apriori spezifizierte Zielsprachenformen unrealistisch ist und die praktische Anwendbarkeit vorheriger Arbeiten behindert. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir vor, maschinelle Übersetzungssysteme mit einer quellenseitigen Datenauswertungsmethode zu trainieren, die zufällig ausgewählte Wörter in der Ausgangssprache mit ihren Zielsprachenlemmen annotiert. Wir zeigen, dass Systeme, die auf solchen Augmented Data trainiert sind, für die Terminologieentegration in reale Übersetzungsszenarien leicht einsetzbar sind. Unsere Experimente zur Terminologieversetzung in die morphologisch komplexen baltischen und uralischen Sprachen zeigen eine Verbesserung von bis zu sieben BLEU-Punkten gegenüber Basissystemen ohne Mittel zur Terminologieentegration und eine durchschnittliche Verbesserung von 4 BLEU-Punkten gegenüber der vorherigen Arbeit. Die Ergebnisse der menschlichen Evaluation deuten auf eine 47,7% absolute Verbesserung der Genauigkeit der Termübersetzung bei der Übersetzung ins Lettische gegenüber der vorherigen Arbeit hin.', 'id': 'Kebanyakan pekerjaan baru-baru ini tentang integrasi terminologi dalam terjemahan mesin telah mengasumsikan bahwa terjemahan terminologi telah diberikan dalam bentuk yang cocok untuk kalimat bahasa sasaran. Dalam pekerjaan sehari-hari dari penerjemah profesional, bagaimanapun, jarang terjadi sebagai penerjemah bekerja dengan glosari dua bahasa di mana istilah diberikan dalam bentuk kamus mereka; menemukan bentuk bahasa sasaran yang tepat adalah bagian dari proses terjemahan. Kami berdebat bahwa rekwiżit untuk apriori tertentu bentuk bahasa sasaran tidak realistis dan menghalangi aplikasi praktis dari pekerjaan sebelumnya. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan untuk melatih sistem terjemahan mesin menggunakan metode peningkatan data sisi sumber yang menganotasi kata-kata sumber yang secara acak dipilih dengan lemma bahasa sasaran mereka. Kami menunjukkan bahwa sistem yang dilatih pada data yang meningkat ini mudah digunakan untuk integrasi terminologi dalam skenario terjemahan nyata. Eksperimen kami tentang terjemahan terminologi ke bahasa Baltik dan Ural yang morfologis kompleks menunjukkan peningkatan hingga 7 poin BLEU dibanding sistem dasar tanpa cara untuk integrasi terminologi dan peningkatan rata-rata 4 poin BLEU dibanding kerja sebelumnya. Hasil evaluasi manusia menunjukkan perubahan absolut 47,7% dari pekerjaan sebelumnya dalam akurasi terjemahan term a ketika terjemahan ke Latvia.', 'bg': 'По-голямата част от скорошната работа по терминологичната интеграция в машинния превод предполага, че терминологичните преводи вече се дават във форми, подходящи за изречението на целевия език. В ежедневната работа на професионалните преводачи обаче това рядко се случва, тъй като преводачите работят с двуезични речници, където термините са дадени в речниците им; намирането на правилната форма на целевия език е част от процеса на превод. Ние твърдим, че изискването за apriori конкретни целеви езикови форми е нереалистично и възпрепятства практическата приложимост на предишна работа. В тази работа предлагаме да се обучат системи за машинен превод, използвайки метод за увеличаване на данните от източника, който анотира произволно избрани думи на изходния език с техните целеви езикови леми. Показваме, че системите, обучени за такива разширени данни, са лесно използваеми за терминологична интеграция в реални сценарии за превод. Нашите експерименти с терминологичния превод на морфологично сложните балтийски и уралски езици показват подобрение с до 7 точки спрямо базовите системи без средства за терминологична интеграция и средно подобрение с 4 точки спрямо предишната работа. Резултатите от човешката оценка показват 47,7% абсолютно подобрение спрямо предишната работа в точността на превода на термини при превод на латвийски език.', 'ko': '최근 기계 번역에서 용어 통합에 관한 대부분의 작업은 용어 번역이 이미 목표 언어 문장에 적합한 형식으로 굴절되었다고 가정한다.그러나 전문 번역가의 일상적인 업무에서 이런 상황은 매우 드물다. 왜냐하면 번역원이 사용하는 것은 이중 언어 어휘표이고 그 중에서 용어는 사전 형식으로 제시되기 때문이다.정확한 목표 언어 형식을 찾는 것은 번역 과정의 일부분이다.우리는 선험적으로 지정된 목표 언어 형식에 대한 요구가 비현실적이고 이전 업무의 실제 적용성을 방해한다고 생각한다.이 작업에서 우리는 원본 데이터 강화 방법을 사용하여 기계 번역 시스템을 훈련하는 것을 권장한다. 이 방법은 무작위로 선택한 원본 언어 단어의 목표 언어 인용을 사용하여 그것들을 주석하는 것이다.우리는 실제 번역 장면에서 이러한 증강 데이터 훈련을 바탕으로 하는 시스템은 용어 집적에 사용하기 쉽다는 것을 보여준다.형태가 복잡한 발트해와 우랄어로 용어를 번역한 실험에서는 용어 통합 수단이 없는 상황에서 베이스라인 시스템에 비해 용어 번역이 7개의 BLEU 포인트, 이전 작업과 비교해 평균 4개의 BLEU 포인트가 향상된 것으로 나타났다.인류 평가 결과 라트비아어로 번역될 때 용어 번역 정확도가 이전 작업보다 47.7% 높아졌다.', 'sw': 'Most of the recent work on terminology integration in machine translation has assumed that terminology translations are given already inflected in forms that are suitable for the target language sentence.  Katika kazi ya watafsiri wa kitaalamu kila siku, hata hivyo, ni nadra sana kama watafsiri wanafanya kazi na vituo vya lugha mbili ambapo vipengele vinavyopewa katika matumizi ya lugha yao; kutafuta aina sahihi ya lugha inayolenga ni sehemu ya mchakato wa tafsiri. Tunahoji kwamba mahitaji ya lugha zilizowekwa kwa kiasi kikubwa ni yasiyo na ukweli na yanazuia matumizi ya kazi iliyopita. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza kufundisha mfumo wa kutafsiri mashine kwa kutumia mbinu ya kuongeza taarifa za vyanzo vya habari ambazo huzungumza maneno ya lugha zilizochaguliwa kwa urahisi na vifaa vyao vya lugha. Tunaonyesha kuwa mifumo inayofundishwa kwa taarifa hizi zilizoongezeka zinatumika kwa urahisi kwa ajili ya ushirikiano wa kimataifa katika kipindi cha kutafsiri maisha halisi. Majaribio yetu kuhusu tafsiri ya kitamaduni katika lugha mbalimbali za Kibalki na Uraliki zinaonyesha maendeleo ya hadi 7 BLEU juu ya mifumo ya msingi bila sababu ya kuunganisha ngono za kimaguzi na kuboreshwa kwa kiwango cha wastani wa pointi 4 BLEU juu ya kazi zilizopita. Matokeo ya tathmini za binadamu yanaonyesha maendeleo ya asilimia 47.7 yenye uhakika zaidi ya kazi iliyopita katika ukweli wa tafsiri wakati wa kutafsiri nchini Latvia.', 'fa': 'بیشتر کارهای اخیر روی ترمینالوژی در ترجمه ماشین فرض کرده است که ترجمه\u200cهای ترمینالوژی قبلاً در شکل\u200cهایی که برای جمله زبان هدف مناسب هستند اثر می\u200cدهند. ولی در کار روزانه ترجمه\u200cکننده\u200cهای حرفه\u200cای کمتر است که ترجمه\u200cکننده\u200cها با کلاس\u200cهای دو زبان کار می\u200cکنند، جایی که شرایط در شکل\u200cهای ویژه\u200cهای خود داده می\u200cشوند. پیدا کردن فرم زبان هدف درست بخشی از فرایند ترجمه است. ما بحث می\u200cکنیم که نیازی برای فرم\u200cهای زبان هدف مشخص آپریوری بی\u200cارزشی است و جلوگیری از کارهای پیشینی را می\u200cگیرد. در این کار، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که سیستم\u200cهای ترجمه ماشین را با استفاده از روش افزایش داده\u200cهای منبع آموزش دهیم که به صورت تصادفی کلمات زبان منبع انتخاب شده را با لیماس زبان هدف خود نشان می\u200cدهد. ما نشان می دهیم که سیستم های آموزش بر این اطلاعات افزایش آموزش داده شده برای ترمینالوژی در سناریو ترجمه\u200cهای واقعی استفاده می\u200cکنند. آزمایشات ما در مورد ترمینالوژی به زبانهای بلتیک و اورالیک مربوط به صورت مربوط به صورت مربوط به صورت مربوط به صورت مربوط به عنوان ترمینالوژی، بهترین تر از ۷ نقطه بلیوس بر سیستم\u200cهای پایین بدون هیچ وسیله برای ترمینالوژی و توسعه متوسط ۴ ن نتیجه\u200cهای ارزیابی انسان به عنوان تغییر دادن به لاتویی یک بهبود کامل 47.7 درصد در کار گذشته را نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'tr': 'Maşynyň terjimedeki terjime edilen iň köp eserden terminologiýa integrasynda hem terjime edilen kiçi dil sözlerine uygun bir şekilde täsirli alýar diýip pikir edýär. Şeýle döwletli terjimeleriň günlük işi ýöne bu ýagdaýda terjimeçiler iki dil sözlükleri bilen işleýärler. Bu ýagdaýda sözlükleri olaryň sözlügi şeklinde berilýän terjimeçiler ýagdaýda az. Dogru maksady dili tapmak terjime prosesiniň bir parçasidir. Apriori takyk edilen maksadat dili formlaryň gerekli bolmagynyň gerçekleşmegi däldir we öňki işiň praktik başarylygyny impedir edip bilýäris. Bu işde, maşynyň terjime sistemlerini çeşme sahypasynda saýlanan çeşme dillerini lemmaları bilen täzelenýän üçin bilim sistemlerini öwretmegi teklip berýäris. Biz bu ýaly gelişmiş maglumatlarda öwrenme sistemalaryň gerçek-durmuş terjime senaryýasynda terminologiýa integrasy üçin aňsatly ulanjagyny görkeýäris. Terminologiýa terjimelerimiz morfologiýaly karmaşık Baltik we Uraliýa dillerine gözleýän deneylerimiz 7 BLES puç üstünde terminologiýa terjime etmek üçin ýok däldir we öňki işiň üstünde 4 BLEU puç gelişmeleri ýok edir. İnsanyň deňleşiginiň netijesi Latwiýa terjime eden wagtynda 47.7%-de öňki işiň dogrylygyny üýtgedendigini görkezýär.', 'af': "Die meeste van die onlangse werk op terminologie integrasie in masjien vertaling het aangeneem dat terminologie vertalings reeds gegee word in vorms wat geskikte is vir die doel taal seting. In dag-tot dag werk van professionele vertalingers is dit selfs die geval as vertalingers werk met twee tale glossarie waar terme in hul woordeboekvorms gegee word; om die regte doel taal vorm te vind is deel van die vertaling proses. Ons argumenteer dat die verwagting vir apriori gespesifiseer doel taal vorms is onrealistiese en hinder die praktiese toepassing van vorige werk. In hierdie werk, voorstel ons om masjien vertaling stelsels te tref met 'n bron-kant data-augmentasie metode wat willekeurig gekose bron taal woorde annoteer met hul doel taal lemmas. Ons wys dat stelsels onderwerp op sodanige vergroot data is leeg gebruikbaar vir terminologie integrasie in regte lewe vertaling scenarios. Ons eksperimente oor terminologies vertaling in die morfologiese komplekse Baltike en Uraliese tale wys 'n verbetering van tot 7 BLES punte oor basilyn stelsels met geen betekening vir terminologies integrasie en 'n gemiddelde verbetering van 4 BLEU punte oor die vorige werk nie. Resultate van die menslike evaluasie wys 'n 47.7% absoluut verbetering oor die vorige werk in term vertaling presies wanneer vertaling in Latviaanse.", 'sq': 'Shumica e punës së fundit mbi integrimin e terminologjisë në përkthimin e makinave ka supozuar se përkthimet e terminologjisë janë dhënë tashmë në formë që janë të përshtatshme për fjalimin e gjuhës objektive. Në punën e përditshme të përkthyesve profesionale megjithatë, është rrallë rasti pasi përkthyesit punojnë me glosarë dy-gjuhës ku termat janë dhënë në format e tyre të fjalorëve; gjetja e form ës së duhur të gjuhës objektive është pjesë e procesit të përkthimit. Ne argumentojmë se kërkesa për formulat e gjuhës objektive të specifikuara të apriorit është jorealiste dhe pengon aplikabilitetin praktik të punës së mëparshme. Në këtë punë, ne propozojmë të trajnojmë sistemet e përkthimit të makinave duke përdorur një metodë rritjeje të të dhënave nga ana e burimit që anoton fjalët e zgjedhura në mënyrë të rastësishme të gjuhës së burimit me limmat e tyre të gjuhës së objektivit. Ne tregojmë se sistemet e trajnuar në të dhëna të tilla të rritura janë të përdorueshme lehtë për integrimin e terminologjisë në skenarët e përkthimit të jetës reale. Eksperimentet tona mbi përkthimin e terminologjisë në gjuhët morfologjikisht komplekse Baltike dhe Urale tregojnë një përmirësim deri në 7 pikë BLEU mbi sistemet bazë pa asnjë mjet për integrimin e terminologjisë dhe një përmirësim mesatar prej 4 pikësh BLEU mbi punën e mëparshme. Rezultatet e vlerësimit njerëzor tregojnë një përmirësim absolut prej 47.7% ndaj punës së mëparshme në saktësinë e përkthimit të afatit kur përkthehet në letonisht.', 'hy': 'Մեքենայի թարգմանման տերմինոլոգիայի ինտեգրացիայի վերջին աշխատանքի մեծ մասը ենթադրել է, որ տերմինոլոգիայի թարգմանությունները արդեն ներկայացված են ձևերով, որոնք համապատասխանում են նպատակային լեզվի նախադասության Այնուամենայնիվ, մասնագիտական թարգմանիչների առօրյա աշխատանքում հազվադեպ է, երբ թարգմանիչները աշխատում են երկլեզու խմբասարների հետ, որտեղ տերմինները տալիս են բառարանի ձևերում: ճիշտ լեզվի ձևի գտնելը թարգմանման գործընթացի մասն է: Մենք պնդում ենք, որ Ապրիորիի նշանակված լեզվի ձևերի պահանջը ոչ իրական է և խոչընդոտում է նախորդ աշխատանքի գործնական կիրառելիությունը: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք մեքենային թարգմանման համակարգեր վարժեցնել օգտագործելով աղբյուրների տվյալների աճման մեթոդ, որը նշում է պատահական ընտրված աղբյուրների լեզվի բառերը իրենց նպատակային լեզվի լեմմե Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այդպիսի բարձրացված տվյալների վրա սովորեցված համակարգերը հեշտությամբ օգտագործելի են տերմինոլոգիայի ինտեգրացիայի համար իրական կյանքի թարգմանման սցենարներում: Our experiments on terminology translation into the morphologically complex Baltic and Uralic languages show an improvement of up to 7 BLEU points over baseline systems with no means for terminology integration and an average improvement of 4 BLEU points over the previous work.  Մարդկային գնահատման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս 47.7 տոկոսի բացարձակ զարգացում նախորդ աշխատանքի վերաբերյալ տերմինային թարգմանման ճշգրտության հարցում թարգմանելու Լատվիներեն:', 'bn': 'মেশিন অনুবাদের মধ্যে টার্মিনোলজিতে সাম্প্রতিক কাজের বেশীরভাগ ধারণা করেছে যে টার্মিনোলজি অনুবাদ ইতোমধ্যে প্রভাবিত হয়েছে যা লক্ষ্য ভ তবে অনুবাদকরা দুই ভাষার গ্লাসের সাথে কাজ করে যেখানে তাদের অভিভাবক ফর্মে শর্ত প্রদান করা হয়। সঠিক টার্গেট ফর্ম খুঁজে বের করা হচ্ছে অনুবাদ প্রক্রিয়ার অংশ। আমরা যুক্তি দিচ্ছি যে আগের কাজের ব্যাপারে নির্দিষ্ট ট টার্গেট ফর্মের প্রয়োজন হচ্ছে অশ্লীল এবং পূর্বের কাজের বাস এই কাজে আমরা মেশিন অনুবাদ সিস্টেম প্রশিক্ষণ করতে প্রস্তাব করছি একটি উৎস-পাশের ডাটা অ্যাগমেন্টিং পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করে যা তাদের লক্ষ্য ভাষার লে We show that systems trained on such augmented data are readily usable for terminology integration in real-life translation scenarios.  তার্মিনিলজি অনুবাদের উপর আমাদের পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে মোরফোলজিক্যাল জটিল বাল্টিক এবং উরালিক ভাষার মধ্যে যে সমস্ত ভাষায় তারা পূর্ববর্তী কাজে ৪ বিলিউ নির্দেশ প্ ল্যাটভিয়ান অনুবাদ করার সময় মানুষের মূল্যের ফলাফল ৪৭.', 'bs': 'Većina nedavnog rada o integraciji terminologije u prevodu mašine pretpostavila je da su prevodi terminologije već uticali na forme koje su odgovarajuće za ciljnu rečenicu jezika. Međutim, u svakodnevnom radu profesionalnih prevodioca, rijetko je slučaj jer prevodioci rade sa dvojezičkim glossarima gdje se uslovi daju u obliku rečnika; Pronaći pravi oblik jezika je dio procesa prevođenja. Tvrdimo da je zahtjev za određene oblike ciljnog jezika apriori nerealistan i sprječava praktičnu primjenu prethodnog rada. U ovom poslu predlažemo da treniramo sisteme prevoda mašine koristeći metodu povećanja podataka iz izvora koji annotira slučajno izabrane riječi izvornog jezika sa svojim ciljnim jezičkim limama. Pokazujemo da su sustavi obučeni na takvim povećanim podacima lako korišteni za integraciju terminologije u scenarijima prevođenja stvarnog života. Naši eksperimenti o prevodu terminologije na morfološki kompleksni baltski i Uralički jezici pokazuju poboljšanje do 7 BLEU bodova na početnim sistemima bez sredstava za integraciju terminologije i prosječno poboljšanje 4 BLEU bodova na prethodnom radu. Rezultati procjene ljudske procjene ukazuju na apsolutno poboljšanje 47,7% tokom prethodnog rada u terminalnoj preciznosti prevoda kada se prevodi na latinski.', 'az': 'Makinelərin tercümətində terminoloji integrasiyasının çoxunun terminoloji tercümələrinin əvvəlcə məqsəd dil sözlərinə uyğun formlarla təsir edildiyini iddia etdi. Ancaq hər gün profesyonel tercümənçilərin işləri, sözlük formlarında şartları verilən iki dil sözlükləri ilə işlədikləri zaman çox az olur. Doğru məqsəd dilini tapmaq tərcümə sürətinin bir parçasıdır. Biz, apriori təyin edilmiş məqsəd dil formları üçün müəyyən edilməsi unrealistik və əvvəlki işin praktika uyğunluğuna mane edirik. Bu işdə, maşın çevirim sistemlərini təhsil edirik ki, məqsəd dillərini lemləri ilə təhsil edilən mənbə dillərini təhsil edir. Biz bu yüksək məlumatlarda təhsil edilən sistemlərin gerçek həyat çeviri senaryoylarında terminoloji integrasiya üçün asanlıqla faydalanır. Terminolojik çevirilmək təcrübələrimiz morfolojik kompleks Baltik və Ural dillərinə göstərir, terminolojik integrasiya və əvvəlki işdə 4 BLEU nöqtələrinin ortalaması üçün 7 BLEU nöqtələrində daha yaxşılıqlarını göstərir. İnsan değerlendirməsinin sonuçları, əvvəlki işlərdə Latvijaya çevirdiyi zaman, tercümə doğruluğunda 47,7%-in tamamlanmasını göstərir.', 'am': 'በአሁኑ ጊዜ በቋንቋ ትርጉም ላይ ተርሚኖሎጂ ማጠቃለያ የሚደረገውን ትርሚኖሎጂ ትርጉም አሁን በመጠቀም በሚያስፈልጉት ቋንቋ ቋንቋ ቋንቋ በሚያስፈልጉት ፎርማዎች እንዲያሳስብ ነው ብለዋል፡፡ በአሁኑ ቀኑ የባለሞያ ትርጉም ሥራ፣ ነገር ግን ትርጓሚዎች በቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች መሠረት በሚያደርጉ ጉዳይ ጥቂት ጊዜ ነው፡፡ የመስመር ቋንቋ ፎርማውን ማግኘት የግል ክፍል ነው፡፡ የአካባቢ ቋንቋ ፎርማዎች እንዲያስፈልገው እናጋራለን፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የmachine ትርጉም systems በመጠቀም የsource-side data augmentation method እናስጠንቃለን፡፡ እንደዚህ ያሉ ተጨማሪው ዳታዎች የተጠቃሚ ሲስተምሩ ለተርሚኖሎጂ ማጠቃቀሚያ በተቃራኒ መሆኑን እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ በተርሚኖሎጂ ትርጉም ላይ የሞሮፎሎጂ ትርጓሜያችን ወደ ባሎቲ እና ወደ ኦርላሊክ ቋንቋዎች የሚደረገውን የብሊዩን ደረጃዎች የባሕላዊ ጥናት በማድረግ ስርዓት ማቀናቀል እና ለመጀመሪያው ስርዓት ላይ 4 ቢሌU ነጥቦችን በማድረግ ጥሩ ማድረግ የለውም፡፡ የሰው ማስታወቂያ ውጤቶች ወደ ላጥቪያን በመትረፍ በተለይም ትርጓሜ እርግጠኛ ላይ 47.7 በመቶ አካባቢ ክፍል ማሳየት ነው፡፡', 'cs': 'Většina nedávných prací na integraci terminologie v strojovém překladu předpokládá, že terminologické překlady jsou již deformovány ve formách, které jsou vhodné pro větu cílového jazyka. V každodenní práci profesionálních překladatelů je tomu však zřídka, protože překladatelé pracují s dvojjazyčnými slovníky, kde jsou pojmy uvedeny ve slovníkových formulářích; Součástí překladatelského procesu je nalezení správné formy cílového jazyka. Tvrdíme, že požadavek na apriori specifikované cílové jazykové formy je nerealistický a brání praktické uplatnitelnosti předchozí práce. V této práci navrhujeme trénovat strojové překladové systémy pomocí metody rozšíření dat na straně zdroje, která anotuje náhodně vybraná slova zdrojového jazyka s jejich lemma cílového jazyka. Ukazujeme, že systémy trénované na těchto rozšířených datech jsou snadno použitelné pro integraci terminologie do reálných scénářů překladu. Naše experimenty s překladem terminologie do morfologicky složitých baltských a uralských jazyků ukazují zlepšení až sedmi BLEU bodů oproti základním systémům bez prostředků pro integraci terminologie a průměrné zlepšení čtyř BLEU bodů oproti předchozí práci. Výsledky lidského hodnocení ukazují na 47,7% absolutní zlepšení přesnosti překladu termínů při překladu do lotyštiny oproti předchozí práci.', 'ca': "La majoria dels treballs recents sobre integració terminològica en la traducció màquina han suposat que les traduccions terminològices ja s'influeixen en formes adequades a la frase de llenguatge alvo. No obstant això, en el treball quotidian dels traductors professionals, rarament és el cas quan els traductors treballen amb glossaris bilingües on es diuen termes en les seves formes de diccionari; trobar la forma correcta del llenguatge alvo és part del procés de traducció. Argumentem que el requisit de les formes de llenguatge alvo especificades en apriori és irrealista i impedeix l'aplicabilitat pràctica del treball anterior. En aquesta feina, proposem treinar els sistemes de traducció màquina utilitzant un mètode d'augmentació de les dades de la font que anota paraules de llenguatge d'origen seleccionats aleatòriament amb els seus lemmes de llenguatge alvo. Mostrem que els sistemes entrenats en aquestes dades augmentates són fàcilment útils per integrar la terminologia en escenaris de traducció de la vida real. Els nostres experiments de traducció terminològica a les llengües Bàltiques i Uràliques morfològicament complexes mostran una millora de fins a 7 punts BLEU en comparació amb els sistemes de base sense mitjans d'integració terminològica i una millora mitjana de 4 punts BLEU en comparació amb el treball anterior. Results of the human evaluation indicate a 47.7% absolute improvement over the previous work in term translation accuracy when translating into Latvian.", 'et': 'Enamik hiljutistest masintõlke terminoloogilise integratsiooni töödest on eeldanud, et terminoloogilised tõlked on juba suunatud sihtkeele lausele sobivates vormides. Kutseliste tõlkijate igapäevases töös on see siiski harva, sest tõlkijad töötavad kahekeelsete sõnastikutega, kus terminid on esitatud sõnastikuvormides; Õige sihtkeele vormi leidmine on osa tõlkeprotsessist. Väidame, et apriori täpsustatud sihtkeele vormide nõue on ebareaalne ja takistab varasema töö praktilist rakendatavust. Käesolevas töös teeme ettepaneku masintõlkesüsteemide koolitamiseks, kasutades lähtepoolset andmete suurendamise meetodit, mis märgistab juhuslikult valitud lähtekeelseid sõnu sihtkeele lemmadega. Näitame, et sellistele täiendatud andmetele koolitatud süsteemid on kergesti kasutatavad terminoloogia integreerimiseks reaalsetes tõlketsenaariumides. Meie eksperimendid terminoloogia tõlkimisel morfoloogiliselt keerukatesse balti ja uurali keeltesse näitavad, et algsüsteemidega võrreldes on paranenud kuni 7 BLEU punkti võrra, ilma et oleks võimalik terminoloogia integratsiooni võimalusi ning keskmiselt 4 BLEU punkti võrra võrreldes eelmise tööga. Inimhinnangu tulemused näitavad 47,7% absoluutset paranemist terminitõlke täpsuses võrreldes eelmise tööga läti keelde tõlkimisel.', 'fi': 'Suurin osa viimeaikaisesta konekäännöksen terminologian integrointia käsittelevästä työstä on olettanut, että terminologiakäännökset tehdään jo taivutettuina kohdekielelle sopivassa muodossa. Ammattikielisten kääntäjien päivittäisessä työssä näin on kuitenkin harvoin, koska kääntäjät käyttävät kaksikielisiä sanastoja, joissa sanakirjoissa on termejä. Oikean kohdekielilomakkeen löytäminen on osa käännösprosessia. Väitämme, että apriori-määriteltyjen kohdekielilomakkeiden vaatimus on epärealistinen ja vaikeuttaa aikaisempien töiden käytännön sovellettavuutta. Tässä työssä ehdotamme konekäännösjärjestelmien kouluttamista lähdepuolen datan augmentaatiomenetelmällä, joka havainnollistaa satunnaisesti valittuja lähdekielisanoja kohdekielilemmoillaan. Osoitamme, että tällaiseen lisättyyn dataan koulutetut järjestelmät ovat helposti käytettävissä terminologian integroinnissa tosielämän käännöskenaarioissa. Kokeemme terminologian kääntämisestä morfologisesti monimutkaisille balttilaisille ja uralilaisille kielille osoittavat jopa 7 BLEU-pisteen parannuksen perusjärjestelmiin verrattuna ilman keinoja terminologian integrointiin ja keskimäärin 4 BLEU-pisteen parannuksen edelliseen työhön verrattuna. Ihmisarvioinnin tulokset osoittavat, että termikäännösten tarkkuus on parantunut 47,7% edelliseen työhön verrattuna latviaan käännettäessä.', 'sk': 'Večina nedavnih del terminološke integracije v strojnem prevajanju je predvidevala, da so terminološki prevodi že upogibljeni v oblikah, primernih za stavek ciljnega jezika. Pri vsakodnevnem delu profesionalnih prevajalcev pa je to redko, saj prevajalci delajo z dvojezičnimi slovarji, kjer so izrazi navedeni v slovarskih oblikah; Iskanje ustreznega obrazca ciljnega jezika je del procesa prevajanja. Trdimo, da je zahteva po apriorskih obrazcih ciljnega jezika nerealna in ovira praktično uporabnost predhodnega dela. V tem delu predlagamo usposabljanje sistemov strojnega prevajanja z uporabo metode povečanja podatkov na izvorni strani, ki naključno izbrane izvorne besede označuje z lemmami ciljnega jezika. Pokazali smo, da so sistemi, usposobljeni za takšne povečane podatke, zlahka uporabni za terminološko integracijo v realnih prevajalskih scenarijih. Naši eksperimenti s prevajanjem terminologije v morfološko kompleksne baltske in uranske jezike kažejo izboljšanje do 7 točk BLEU v primerjavi z osnovnimi sistemi brez sredstev za integracijo terminologije in povprečno izboljšanje 4 točke BLEU v primerjavi s prejšnjim delom. Rezultati človeške ocene kažejo 47,7% absolutno izboljšanje natančnosti prevajanja terminov pri prevajanju v latvijščino v primerjavi s prejšnjim delom.', 'he': 'Most of the recent work on terminology integration in machine translation has assumed that terminology translations are given already inflected in forms that are suitable for the target language sentence.  In day-to-day work of professional translators, however, it is seldom the case as translators work with bilingual glossaries where terms are given in their dictionary forms;  מציאת צורת שפת המטרה הנכונה היא חלק מהתהליך התרגום. אנו מתווכחים שהדרישה לצורות שפת המטרה המסופרות של אפריורי אינה מציאותית ומחסכת את אפשרות הפרקטית של העבודה הקודמת. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים לאמן מערכות התרגום מכונות בשימוש שיטת גידול נתונים מצד מקור שמציין מילים בשפה מקור שנבחרו באופן אקראי עם לימות השפה המטרה שלהם. We show that systems trained on such augmented data are readily usable for terminology integration in real-life translation scenarios.  Our experiments on terminology translation into the morphologically complex Baltic and Uralic languages show an improvement of up to 7 BLEU points over baseline systems with no means for terminology integration and an average improvement of 4 BLEU points over the previous work.  תוצאות הערכה האנושית מצביעות על שיפור מוחלט של 47.7% על העבודה הקודמת בתרגום מדויק כשהתרגם ללטבית.', 'ha': "Babu mafi yawan aiki a lokacin da aka haɗa tsammogi cikin fassarar maɓallin kwamfyuta sun yi zato an gaskata fassarori taƙaitori na riga an an yi amfani da cikin fassaran tsari da ke daidai wa maganar harshen wanda aka yi amfani da. Ki a yinin aikin fassarar masu shawara, kuma amma, shi yana da daidai idan fassarar ke aiki da takardar lugha biyu ko da aka ƙayyade maganar cikin fomat na dictionary; QRegExp Tuna jãyayya da cewa zaɓen tsarin harshen da aka ƙayyade aforiri na kasa lissafa kuma yana kange masu amfani da aikin da ya gabata. Daga wannan aikin, Munã kwaɗayin mu tunkuɗe tsarin translation ɗin mashine da za'a yi amfani da shiryarwa na-side data, wanda za'a zartar da maganar ziman da aka buƙata da randala da kuma don su yi amfani da limma na lugha. We show that systems trained on such augmented data are readily usable for terminology integration in real-life translation scenarios.  TajararinMu na fassarar tamarilojiya a cikin harshen morfologi mai murakku na Baltic da Uralic, yana nuna mafiya kyauta ko 7 BLEU points kowaci a kan system-bango, bã da wani matsayi ga integrity na tsohon-daraja kuma an ƙara gaba wa 4 BLEU points na gabanin aikin na farko. Faramar evaluation na mutum yana nũna wata 47.7% mai kami mai kyau wa aikin da ya gabata cikin fassarar gaskiya idan an fassara cikin Latiya.", 'jv': 'Terjamahan sing paling nggo yen nggo nggawe terminal, akeh operasi kapan kanggo tarjamahan karo ingkang sampeyan, dadi kapan terjamahan kawet nggo ndelok terjamahan Nanging, dino-loro saiki uwong, dadi mbukak tentang karo perusahaan urip karo nganggo ingkang dipunasaben kanggo ingkang dipunasaben, ora dadi, akeh papat kanggo ngerawakdhéwé karo ingkang dipunasaben karo akeh dumadhi, kawula ngupakan langgar sampeyan urip saiki;  Jejaring Awak dhéwé sawetara bener kanggo kalagayang nggawe tarjamahan kanggo nguasai tarjamahan kanggo nik nggawe barang nggawe barang praksi kanggo nguasai gawan dhéwé. Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné supoyo nggawe sistem tarjamahan karo sistem kuwi nggawe sistem kuwi nggawe dadi tangguna-tangguna kuwi wis ngerawake tarjamahan kanggo ngerawake tarjamahan kanggo limu nggawe. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing tukong ing kaya data anyuré, dadi sing ngejaraké perusahaan kanggo tarjamahan kanggo ingkang terminal. Awak dhéwé éntuk kapan terminal nggunakake tarjamahan kanggo masangkap banter Baltik lan Uralik dhéwé nggawe geranggap tanggap 7 B luwih punt kanggo ditambah sistem sing bisa perusahaan kanggo ngerasakno sistem sing dadi kapan interpolasi kanggo nyebuturan ingkang 4 B luwih punt kanggo dianggap oleh Rejaleng kapan tanggal uwong sing ngerasai tambah kapan ning ayun-ayun wigatining sedhaya sedhaya, kawula sedhaya punika ingkang dianggap kanggo nguasai kapan kanggo terjamahan kanggo ngerasai Latwian.', 'bo': 'ཆག་སྤྲོད་ནང་གི་བརྡ་ཆད་ཆ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་ལས་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་སྒྲུང་གཏམ་ནང་ལ་ཕན་ཚུན་འཆར་བ་ཡིན་འདུག ཡིན་ནའང་། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ལས་ཟུར་བའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག དབྱིབས་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་དེ་ཚོར་སྐད་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཤས་ཞིག་རེད། ང་ཚོས་ཟིན་བྲིས་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་ལ་དགོས་མཚམས་འཇོག་ན་ཕན་རྒྱུ་མེད་དང་། སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་ལ་ལག་སྟར ང་ཚོས་ལག་ལེན་པ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་མ་ལག་གི་ཡིག་སྣོད་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བསྡུར་ན། We show that systems trained on such augmented data are readily usable for terminology integration in real-life translation scenarios. Our experiments on terminology translation into the morphologically complex Baltic and Uralic languages show an improvement of up to 7 BLEU points over baseline systems with no means for terminology integration and an average improvement of 4 BLEU points over the previous work. མིའི་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་གྲངས་འབོར་གྱི་གནད་ཅིག་ནི་ལ Latvian དབྱེ་ཚིག་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་སྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྡན་པའི་སྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྡན་47.7%.'}
{'en': 'Summarising Historical Text in Modern Languages', 'fr': 'Résumer un texte historique dans les langues modernes', 'ar': 'تلخيص النص التاريخي باللغات الحديثة', 'es': 'Resumir textos históricos en idiomas modernos', 'pt': 'Resumindo Texto Histórico em Línguas Modernas', 'zh': '以今代语言总结史本', 'ja': '現代語の歴史的テキストの要約', 'hi': 'आधुनिक भाषाओं में ऐतिहासिक पाठ को सारांशित करना', 'ga': 'Achoimre ar Théacs Stairiúil sna Nuatheangacha', 'ru': 'Резюме исторического текста на современных языках', 'hu': 'Történelmi szöveg összefoglalása modern nyelvekben', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Σύνοψη ιστορικού κειμένου στις σύγχρονες γλώσσες', 'lt': 'Istorinio teksto šiuolaikinėmis kalbomis santrauka', 'it': 'Sintesi del testo storico nelle lingue moderne', 'mk': 'Преглед на историскиот текст на модерните јазици', 'ms': 'Ringkasan Teks Sejarah dalam Bahasa Modern', 'ml': 'ആദ്യ ഭാഷകളിലെ ചരിത്ര പദാവലി', 'mt': 'It-test storiku fil-qosor fil-lingwi moderni', 'pl': 'Podsumowanie tekstu historycznego w językach współczesnych', 'ro': 'Rezumatul textului istoric în limbile moderne', 'sr': 'Sažetak istorijskog teksta na modernim jezicima', 'mn': 'Орчин үеийн хэлний түүхийн текст', 'so': 'Taariikhda taariikhda ee luuqadaha Modern', 'sv': 'Sammanfattning av historisk text på moderna språk', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'மாதிரி மொழிகளில் சுருக்கும் வரலாறு உரை', 'ur': 'اذن زبانوں میں تاریخی پیغام جمع کرتی ہے', 'no': 'Samandrande historisk tekst i moderne språk', 'kk': 'Қазіргі тілдерде таңбашалық тарихлық мәтін', 'vi': 'Triệu hồi Văn bản Lịch sử về Ngôn ngữ Hiện đại', 'uz': 'Name', 'hr': 'Sažetak istorijskog teksta na modernim jezicima', 'da': 'Opsummering af historisk tekst i moderne sprog', 'bg': 'Обобщение на историческия текст в съвременните езици', 'nl': 'Samenvatting van historische tekst in moderne talen', 'ko': '현대 언어로 역사 텍스트를 총결하다', 'id': 'Ringkasan Teks Sejarah dalam Bahasa Modern', 'de': 'Zusammenfassung historischer Texte in modernen Sprachen', 'af': 'Name', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Text in Modern Lugha', 'tr': 'Modern Diller', 'sq': 'Përmbledhja e tekstit historik në gjuhët moderne', 'am': 'ማጠቃለያ ታሪክ ጽሑፍ ውስጥ አዲስ ቋንቋዎች', 'hy': 'Պատմական տեքստը համառոտագրելով ժամանակակից լեզուներում', 'az': 'Modern Dill…ôrd…ô Tarihi Metni Topla≈üdƒ±rmaq', 'bn': 'আধুনিক ভাষায় সামারসংক্ষিপ্ত ইতিহাসিক টেক্সট', 'ca': 'Resumir el text històric en llengües modernes', 'cs': 'Shrnutí historického textu v moderních jazycích', 'et': 'Ajaloolise teksti kokkuvõte kaasaegsetes keeltes', 'bs': 'Sažetak istorijskog teksta na modernim jezicima', 'fi': 'Yhteenveto historiallisista teksteistä nykyaikaisilla kielillä', 'sk': 'Povzetek zgodovinskega besedila v sodobnih jezikih', 'he': 'מסכם טקסט היסטורי בשפות מודרניות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Modern Languages', 'jv': 'structural navigation'}
{'en': 'We introduce the task of historical text summarisation, where documents in historical forms of a language are summarised in the corresponding modern language. This is a fundamentally important routine to historians and digital humanities researchers but has never been automated. We compile a high-quality gold-standard text summarisation dataset, which consists of historical German and Chinese news from hundreds of years ago summarised in modern German or Chinese. Based on cross-lingual transfer learning techniques, we propose a summarisation model that can be trained even with no cross-lingual (historical to modern) parallel data, and further benchmark it against state-of-the-art algorithms. We report automatic and human evaluations that distinguish the historic to modern language summarisation task from standard cross-lingual summarisation (i.e., modern to modern language), highlight the distinctness and value of our dataset, and demonstrate that our transfer learning approach outperforms standard cross-lingual benchmarks on this task.', 'fr': "Nous introduisons la tâche de synthèse de textes historiques, où les documents dans les formes historiques d'une langue sont résumés dans la langue moderne correspondante. Il s'agit d'une routine fondamentale pour les historiens et les chercheurs en sciences humaines numériques, mais elle n'a jamais été automatisée. Nous compilons un ensemble de données de synthèse de texte standard de haute qualité, qui comprend des informations historiques en allemand et en chinois datant d'il y a des centaines d'années résumées en allemand ou en chinois moderne. Sur la base de techniques d'apprentissage par transfert multilingue, nous proposons un modèle de synthèse qui peut être entraîné même sans données parallèles interlinguistiques (historiques à modernes), et nous le comparons davantage à des algorithmes de pointe. Nous rapportons des évaluations automatiques et humaines qui distinguent la tâche de synthèse de la langue historique vers la langue moderne de la synthèse multilingue standard (c'est-à-dire du moderne au langage moderne), mettent en évidence le caractère distinctif et la valeur de notre ensemble de données et démontrent que notre approche d'apprentissage par transfert surpasse la norme des repères multilingues sur cette tâche.", 'pt': 'Introduzimos a tarefa de sumarização de textos históricos, onde documentos em formas históricas de uma língua são resumidos na língua moderna correspondente. Esta é uma rotina fundamentalmente importante para historiadores e pesquisadores de humanidades digitais, mas nunca foi automatizada. Compilamos um conjunto de dados de resumo de texto padrão ouro de alta qualidade, que consiste em notícias históricas alemãs e chinesas de centenas de anos atrás resumidas em alemão moderno ou chinês. Com base em técnicas de aprendizagem de transferência multilíngue, propomos um modelo de sumarização que pode ser treinado mesmo sem dados paralelos multilíngues (históricos a modernos), e ainda o comparamos com algoritmos de última geração. Relatamos avaliações automáticas e humanas que distinguem a tarefa de resumo de idioma histórico para moderno do resumo multilíngue padrão (ou seja, idioma moderno para idioma moderno), destacam a distinção e o valor de nosso conjunto de dados e demonstram que nossa abordagem de aprendizagem por transferência supera o desempenho cruzado padrão referências linguísticas nesta tarefa.', 'es': 'Presentamos la tarea de resumir textos históricos, donde los documentos en formas históricas de un idioma se resumen en el idioma moderno correspondiente. Esta es una rutina de fundamental importancia para los historiadores e investigadores de humanidades digitales, pero nunca se ha automatizado. Recopilamos un conjunto de datos de resumen de textos de alta calidad, que consiste en noticias históricas alemanas y chinas de hace cientos de años resumidas en alemán o chino moderno. Basado en técnicas de aprendizaje por transferencia multilingüe, proponemos un modelo de resumen que se puede entrenar incluso sin datos paralelos interlingües (históricos a modernos) y compararlo con algoritmos de última generación. Reportamos evaluaciones automáticas y humanas que distinguen la tarea de resumen del lenguaje histórico al moderno del resumen multilingüe estándar (es decir, del lenguaje moderno al moderno), destacamos la distinción y el valor de nuestro conjunto de datos y demostramos que nuestro enfoque de aprendizaje por transferencia supera el estándar puntos de referencia multilingües en esta tarea.', 'ar': 'نقدم مهمة تلخيص النص التاريخي ، حيث يتم تلخيص الوثائق في الأشكال التاريخية للغة في اللغة الحديثة المقابلة. يعد هذا روتينًا مهمًا بشكل أساسي للمؤرخين والباحثين في العلوم الإنسانية الرقمية ولكن لم يتم تشغيله تلقائيًا. نقوم بتجميع مجموعة بيانات تلخيص نصية عالية الجودة بمعايير ذهبية ، والتي تتكون من أخبار ألمانية وصينية تاريخية من مئات السنين وملخصة بالألمانية أو الصينية الحديثة. استنادًا إلى تقنيات تعلم النقل عبر اللغات ، نقترح نموذجًا تلخيصًا يمكن تدريبه حتى مع عدم وجود بيانات موازية متعددة اللغات (تاريخية إلى حديثة) ، ونقوم بمقارنتها مع أحدث الخوارزميات. نقوم بالإبلاغ عن التقييمات التلقائية والبشرية التي تميز مهمة تلخيص اللغة التاريخية إلى الحديثة من التلخيص القياسي متعدد اللغات (أي اللغة الحديثة إلى اللغة الحديثة) ، ونسلط الضوء على تميز وقيمة مجموعة البيانات الخاصة بنا ، ونوضح أن نهج التعلم الخاص بنا يتفوق على المعيار المتقاطع. المعايير اللغوية في هذه المهمة.', 'zh': '引入史摘要,语文档以相应。 于历史学家数人文,此至重之例也,而未尝得自动化。 制一高质量黄金格文本摘要数集,其数百年前用见代德语或中文总结德国、中国史新闻。 盖跨语迁学,吾等建一总结模样,虽无跨语(至今)并行数据,可以训练,并据先进算法更加基准测试。 吾告自与人工评估,将古今语言总要与格语摘要(即现代语言)分别,出我数据集独特性价,并证我们迁学之法优于准的跨语基准。', 'hi': 'हम ऐतिहासिक पाठ सारांश के कार्य का परिचय देते हैं, जहां एक भाषा के ऐतिहासिक रूपों में दस्तावेजों को संबंधित आधुनिक भाषा में संक्षेप में प्रस्तुत किया जाता है। यह इतिहासकारों और डिजिटल मानविकी शोधकर्ताओं के लिए एक मौलिक रूप से महत्वपूर्ण दिनचर्या है, लेकिन इसे कभी स्वचालित नहीं किया गया है। हम एक उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले स्वर्ण-मानक पाठ सारांश डेटासेट को संकलित करते हैं, जिसमें सैकड़ों साल पहले के ऐतिहासिक जर्मन और चीनी समाचार शामिल हैं, जिन्हें आधुनिक जर्मन या चीनी में संक्षेप में प्रस्तुत किया गया था। क्रॉस-लिंगुअल ट्रांसफर लर्निंग तकनीकों के आधार पर, हम एक सारांश मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जिसे बिना क्रॉस-लिंगुअल (ऐतिहासिक से आधुनिक) समानांतर डेटा के साथ भी प्रशिक्षित किया जा सकता है, और आगे इसे अत्याधुनिक एल्गोरिदम के खिलाफ बेंचमार्क किया जा सकता है। हम स्वचालित और मानव मूल्यांकन की रिपोर्ट करते हैं जो मानक क्रॉस-लिंगुअल सारांशीकरण (यानी, आधुनिक से आधुनिक भाषा) से ऐतिहासिक से आधुनिक भाषा सारांशीकरण कार्य को अलग करते हैं, हमारे डेटासेट की विशिष्टता और मूल्य को उजागर करते हैं, और प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि हमारा स्थानांतरण सीखने का दृष्टिकोण इस कार्य पर मानक क्रॉस-लिंगुअल बेंचमार्क को बेहतर बनाता है।', 'ja': '歴史的な言語の歴史的な形式の文書が対応する現代の言語で要約される、歴史的なテキストの要約のタスクを紹介します。 これは、歴史家やデジタル人文科学の研究者にとって根本的に重要なルーチンですが、自動化されたことはありません。 私たちは、現代のドイツ語または中国語で要約された数百年前の歴史的なドイツおよび中国のニュースからなる、高品質のゴールドスタンダードテキスト要約データセットをまとめています。 クロスリンガル転送学習技術に基づいて、クロスリンガル（過去から現代）の並列データがなくてもトレーニングできる要約モデルを提案し、最先端のアルゴリズムと比較してさらにベンチマークします。 私たちは、歴史的な言語から現代の言語への要約タスクを標準的なクロスリンガル要約（すなわち、現代から現代の言語）と区別し、データセットの特徴と価値を強調し、このタスクでの転送学習アプローチが標準的なクロスリンガルベンチマークを上回ることを実証する自動評価と人間評価を報告します。', 'ru': 'Введем задачу исторического обобщения текста, где документы в исторических формах языка обобщаются на соответствующем современном языке. Это принципиально важная рутина для историков и исследователей цифровых гуманитарных наук, но никогда не была автоматизирована. Мы составляем высококачественный набор данных для обобщения текста золотого стандарта, который состоит из исторических немецких и китайских новостей сотни лет назад, обобщенных на современном немецком или китайском языке. Основываясь на методах межъязыкового обучения, мы предлагаем модель обобщения, которая может быть обучена даже без межъязыковых (от исторических до современных) параллельных данных, и далее сравнивать ее с современными алгоритмами. Мы сообщаем об автоматических и человеческих оценках, которые отличают задачу исторического и современного языкового обобщения от стандартного кросс-лингвистического обобщения (то есть, от современного к современному языку), подчеркивают отличительность и ценность нашего набора данных и демонстрируют, что наш подход к обучению переносу данных превосходит стандартные кросс-лингвистические критерии в этой задаче.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid tús le hachoimriú téacs stairiúil, áit a ndéantar achoimre ar dhoiciméid i bhfoirmeacha stairiúla teanga sa nuatheanga chomhfhreagrach. Is gnáthamh bunúsach tábhachtach é seo do staraithe agus do thaighdeoirí na ndaonnachtaí digiteacha ach ní dhearnadh uathoibriú air riamh. Tiomsaimid tacar sonraí achoimrithe téacs ardchaighdeáin óir-chaighdeán, ina bhfuil nuacht stairiúil na Gearmáine agus na Síne ó na céadta bliain ó shin a bhfuil achoimre orthu i nGearmáinis nó i Sínis nua-aimseartha. Bunaithe ar theicnící foghlama aistrithe tras-teangacha, molaimid múnla achoimrithe ar féidir a oiliúint fiú gan aon sonraí comhthreomhara tras-teangacha (stairiúla go nua-aimseartha), agus é a thagarmharcáil tuilleadh i gcoinne na n-algartam úrscothach. Tuairiscímid meastóireachtaí uathoibríocha agus daonna a dhéanann idirdhealú idir an tasc achoimrithe teanga stairiúil agus nua-aimseartha agus achoimriú caighdeánach tras-teanga (i.e. teanga nua-aimseartha go teanga nua-aimseartha), a aibhsíonn éagsúlacht agus luach ár dtacar sonraí, agus léirímid go sáraíonn ár gcur chuige foghlama aistrithe sárobair chaighdeánach tras-teanga. tagarmharcanna teanga ar an tasc seo.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ისტორიური ტექსტის სიმბოლოების დავაწყენებთ, სადაც ისტორიური ფორმების დოკუმენტები კონფიგურაციაში კონფიგურაცია მდგომარებული ენაში. ეს ფუნდამენტურად მნიშვნელოვანი პროტინია ისტორიისთვის და დიზიტალური ადამიანისთვის განსხვავებელებისთვის, მაგრამ არასდროს ავტომატიკური არაა. ჩვენ კომპიუალურად უფრო კარგალიტიური მონაცემები ტექსტის კომპიუზაციაცია, რომელიც ისტორიური გერმანეთის და ჩინეთის ახალგაზეების შეფარდება ასობით წლის წინ მრავალური ტრანსტრიქტის მექნიკების ბაზაზე, ჩვენ მინდომა კოსტრიქტიფიკაციის მოდელს, რომელიც შეიძლება აკეთება მრავალური ენგური (ისტორიური მნიშვნელური) პარალელური მონაცემებით, და დამატებით მა ჩვენ ავტომატიკური და ადამიანის განსაზღვრებებით, რომელიც ისტორიკური სამყარო ენის კუნუზაციაციის რაოდენობაზე განსხვავებს სტანდარტული კუნუზაციაზე (მაგალითად მოდინარებული ენის კუნუზაციაზე), განსხვავება და მნიშვნელობა ჩვენი მონაცემე', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a történelmi szövegösszefoglalás feladatát, ahol egy nyelv történelmi formájú dokumentumokat a megfelelő modern nyelven foglalják össze. Ez alapvetően fontos rutin a történészek és a digitális bölcsészettudományi kutatók számára, de soha nem automatizálták. Kiváló minőségű, aranyszabású szövegösszefoglaló adatkészletet állítunk össze, amely több száz évvel ezelőtti történelmi német és kínai hírekből áll, amelyeket modern német vagy kínai nyelven összefoglaltak. A többnyelvű transzfer tanulási technikák alapján olyan összefoglaló modellt javasolunk, amely akár többnyelvű (történelmi és modern) párhuzamos adatok nélkül is kiképzhető, és tovább összehasonlítható a legkorszerűbb algoritmusokkal. Automatikus és emberi értékelésekről beszámolunk, amelyek megkülönböztetik a történelmi és modern nyelvi összefoglalási feladatot a standard, többnyelvű összefoglalástól (azaz a modern és modern nyelvig), kiemelik adatkészletünk megkülönböztetőségét és értékét, és bebizonyítják, hogy transzfer tanulási megközelítésünk felülmúlja a standard, többnyelvű referenciaértékeket ebben a feladatban.', 'el': 'Εισάγουμε το έργο της σύνοψης ιστορικών κειμένων, όπου έγγραφα σε ιστορικές μορφές μιας γλώσσας συνοψίζονται στην αντίστοιχη σύγχρονη γλώσσα. Αυτή είναι μια θεμελιώδης σημαντική ρουτίνα για τους ιστορικούς και τους ερευνητές των ψηφιακών ανθρωπιστικών επιστημών, αλλά ποτέ δεν έχει αυτοματοποιηθεί. Συντάσσουμε ένα υψηλής ποιότητας σύνολο δεδομένων σύνοψης κειμένου χρυσού προτύπου, το οποίο αποτελείται από ιστορικά γερμανικά και κινεζικά νέα από εκατοντάδες χρόνια πριν που συνοψίζονται στα σύγχρονα γερμανικά ή κινέζικα. Με βάση τις τεχνικές εκμάθησης μεταξύ γλωσσών μεταφοράς, προτείνουμε ένα συνοπτικό μοντέλο που μπορεί να εκπαιδευτεί ακόμη και χωρίς γλωσσικά (ιστορικά έως σύγχρονα) παράλληλα δεδομένα και να το συγκρίνουμε περαιτέρω με αλγόριθμους τελευταίας τεχνολογίας. Αναφέρουμε αυτόματες και ανθρώπινες αξιολογήσεις που διακρίνουν την ιστορική από τη σύγχρονη εργασία σύνοψης γλωσσών από την τυπική διαγώνια σύνοψη (δηλαδή τη σύγχρονη στη σύγχρονη γλώσσα), επισημαίνουν τη διακριτικότητα και την αξία του συνόλου δεδομένων μας και αποδεικνύουν ότι η προσέγγιση εκμάθησης μεταφοράς ξεπερνά τα τυπικά διαγώνια κριτήρια αναφοράς σε αυτό το έργο.', 'it': "Introducemo il compito della sintesi storica del testo, dove i documenti in forme storiche di una lingua sono riassunti nella corrispondente lingua moderna. Questa è una routine fondamentale per gli storici e i ricercatori di scienze umanistiche digitali, ma non è mai stata automatizzata. Compiliamo un set di dati di sintesi testuale di alta qualità, composto da notizie storiche tedesche e cinesi di centinaia di anni fa riassunte in tedesco o cinese moderno. Basato su tecniche di apprendimento cross-lingual transfer, proponiamo un modello di sintesi che può essere addestrato anche senza dati paralleli cross-lingual (storici a moderni) e ulteriormente confrontato con algoritmi all'avanguardia. Riportiamo valutazioni automatiche e umane che distinguono l'attività di sintesi linguistica storica da quella moderna dalla sintesi multilingue standard (cioè dal linguaggio moderno a quello moderno), evidenziano la distinzione e il valore del nostro set di dati e dimostrano che il nostro approccio di apprendimento del trasferimento supera i parametri di riferimento cross-lingual standard in questo compito.", 'lt': 'Įvedame istorinės teksto santraukos užduotį, kurioje istorinės kalbos formos dokumentai santraukiami atitinkama šiuolaikine kalba. Tai iš esmės svarbi praktika istorikams ir skaitmeninės humanitarinės mokslo mokslininkams, bet niekada nebuvo automatizuota. Mes renkame aukštos kokybės aukso standarto teksto santraukos duomenų rinkinį, kurį sudaro istorinės Vokietijos ir Kinijos naujienos, gautos prieš šimtus metų, santraukos šiuolaikiškai vokiečių arba kinų kalbomis. Based on cross-lingual transfer learning techniques, we propose a summarisation model that can be trained even with no cross-lingual (historical to modern) parallel data, and further benchmark it against state-of-the-art algorithms.  Mes pranešame apie automatinius ir žmogiškuosius vertinimus, kurie skiria istorinę ir šiuolaikinę kalbų santraukų užduotį nuo standartinės tarpkalbinės santraukos (t. y. šiuolaikinės ir šiuolaikinės kalbos), pabrėžia mūsų duomenų rinkinio skirtumą ir vertę ir įrodo, kad mūsų mokymosi perdavimu metodas atitinka standartinius tarpkalbinius šios užduoties lyginamuosius rodiklius.', 'mk': 'Ние ја воведуваме задачата на историската резултатација на текстот, каде документите во историски форми на јазик се резултатираат на соодветниот модерен јазик. Ова е фундаментално важна рутина за историчарите и истражувачите на дигиталната хуманост, но никогаш не е автоматизирана. Компилираме висококвалитетен набор на податоци за резултат на златниот текст, кој се состои од историски германски и кинески вести од пред стотици години резултатирани на модерни германски или кинески. Based on cross-lingual transfer learning techniques, we propose a summarisation model that can be trained even with no cross-lingual (historical to modern) parallel data, and further benchmark it against state-of-the-art algorithms.  Ние известуваме автоматски и човечки проценки кои ја разликуваат историската и модерната задача за резултатирање на јазикот од стандардната прекујазична резултатирање (т.е., модерниот до модерниот јазик), ја истакнуваат разликата и вредноста на нашиот податок и демонстрираат дека нашиот пристап на учење на трансференциите ги надминува', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan tugas ringkasan teks sejarah, di mana dokumen dalam bentuk sejarah bahasa digambarkan dalam bahasa modern yang sepadan. Ini adalah rutin yang sangat penting bagi sejarah dan peneliti kemanusiaan digital tetapi tidak pernah automatik. Kami mengumpulkan set data ringkasan teks piawai emas berkualiti tinggi, yang terdiri dari berita sejarah Jerman dan Cina dari ratusan tahun yang lalu ringkasan dalam bahasa Jerman atau Cina modern. Berdasarkan teknik pembelajaran pemindahan saling bahasa, kami cadangkan model ringkasan yang boleh dilatih walaupun tanpa data selari saling bahasa (sejarah ke modern), dan lebih lanjut benchmark terhadap algoritma-state-of-the-art. Kami melaporkan penilaian automatik dan manusia yang membedakan tugas penghuraian bahasa sejarah kepada bahasa modern dari penghuraian bahasa-bahasa biasa (iaitu bahasa-bahasa modern ke modern), menentukan perbezaan dan nilai set data kami, dan menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan pembelajaran pemindahan kita melebihi tanda referensi bahasa-bahasa biasa pada tugas ini.', 'ml': 'We introduce the task of historical text summarisation, where documents in historical forms of a language are summarised in the corresponding modern language.  ഇത് ചരിത്രത്തിലെയും ഡിജിറ്റല്\u200d മനുഷ്യരുടെയും പരിശോധിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്കും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു രീതിയാണ്. പക്ഷെ ഒരിക് നൂറുവര്\u200dഷങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് മുമ്പ് നൂറ് വര്\u200dഷങ്ങള്\u200dക്കോ ആധുനിക ജര്\u200dമ്മനിലോ ചൈനീസിലോ ചരിത്ര ജര്\u200dമ്മനിയില്\u200d നിന്നും ചരിത്രത്തിലെ വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d  Based on cross-lingual transfer learning techniques, we propose a summarisation model that can be trained even with no cross-lingual (historical to modern) parallel data, and further benchmark it against state-of-the-art algorithms.  നമ്മുടെ ഡാറ്റാസസെറ്റിന്റെ വ്യത്യാസവും മൂല്യങ്ങളും നാം സ്വയമായി റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നു. ചരിത്രത്തിലേക്ക് ആധുനിക ഭാഷയിലേക്ക് വേര്\u200dപെടുത്തുന്ന ചരിത്രത്തിലേക്കും മനുഷ്യന്\u200d വിലാസങ', 'mt': 'Aħna nintroduċu l-kompitu tas-sommarju tat-test storiku, fejn id-dokumenti f’forom storiċi ta’ lingwa huma sommarji fil-lingwa modern a korrispondenti. This is a fundamentally important routine to historians and digital humanities researchers but has never been automated.  Aħna nġabru sett ta’ dejta ta’ sommarju tat-test standard tad-deheb ta’ kwalità għolja, li jikkonsisti f’a ħbarijiet storiċi Ġermaniżi u Ċiniżi minn mijiet ta’ snin ilu mqassra fil-qosor bil-Ġermaniż modern jew biċ-Ċiniż. Abbażi ta’ tekniki ta’ tagħlim ta’ trasferiment translingwi, qed nipproponu mudell ta’ sommarju li jista’ jitħarreġ anki mingħajr dejta parallel a translingwali (storika għal moderna), u nibgħuha aktar komparattiva mal-algoritmi l-aktar avvanzati. We report automatic and human evaluations that distinguish the historic to modern language summarisation task from standard cross-lingual summarisation (i.e., modern to modern language), highlight the distinctness and value of our dataset, and demonstrate that our transfer learning approach outperforms standard cross-lingual benchmarks on this task.', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy zadanie podsumowania tekstów historycznych, w którym dokumenty w historycznych formach języka są podsumowywane w odpowiednim języku współczesnym. Jest to zasadniczo ważna rutyna dla historyków i badaczy humanistyki cyfrowej, ale nigdy nie została zautomatyzowana. Tworzymy wysokiej jakości zbiór danych dotyczących streszczenia tekstu, który składa się z historycznych wiadomości niemieckich i chińskich sprzed setek lat podsumowanych w języku współczesnym niemieckim lub chińskim. Opierając się na technikach uczenia się transferu między językami, proponujemy model podsumowujący, który można trenować nawet bez równoległych danych między językami (historycznymi i nowoczesnymi), a następnie porównujemy go z najnowocześniejszymi algorytmami. Raportujemy automatyczne i ludzkie oceny, które odróżniają zadanie podsumowania języków historycznych od standardowego podsumowania języka wielojęzycznego (tj. języka nowoczesnego do języka nowoczesnego), podkreślają wyróżnienie i wartość naszego zbioru danych oraz wykazują, że nasze podejście do uczenia się transferowego przewyższa standardowe między językami odniesienia w tym zadaniu.', 'ro': 'Introducem sarcina de rezumare a textelor istorice, în care documentele în forme istorice ale unei limbi sunt rezumate în limba modernă corespunzătoare. Aceasta este o rutină fundamental importantă pentru istorici și cercetători de științe umaniste digitale, dar nu a fost niciodată automatizată. Noi compilăm un set de date de rezumare a textelor de înaltă calitate, care constă din știri istorice germane și chineze din urmă cu sute de ani rezumate în germană sau chineză modernă. Bazat pe tehnici de învățare translingvistică, propunem un model de sinteză care poate fi instruit chiar și fără date paralele translingvistice (istorice până la modernă) și comparat în continuare cu algoritmi de ultimă generație. Raportăm evaluări automate și umane care diferențiază sarcina istorică de cea modernă de cea de rezumare a limbilor de cea translingvistică standard (adică limba modernă până la cea modernă), evidențiază distincția și valoarea setului nostru de date și demonstrează că abordarea noastră de învățare prin transfer depășește criteriile standard translingvistice în această sarcină.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo zadatak sažetke istorijskog teksta, gde su dokumenti u istorijskim oblicima jezika sažeti u odgovarajućem modernom jeziku. Ovo je osnovno važna rutina za istoričare i istraživače digitalne humanitate, ali nikada nije automatski. Kompiliramo rezimentaciju podataka o visokokvalitetnom zlatnom standardnom tekstu, koja se sastoji od istorijskih nemačkih i kineskih vijesti prije stotina godina, sažeta na modernom nemačkom ili kineskom. Na temelju tehnika učenja preko jezika, predlažemo model rezimezacije koji se može obučiti čak i bez preko jezika (istorijskih do modernih) paralelnih podataka, i daljnje je navodimo protiv algoritma stanja umjetnosti. Prijavljujemo automatske i ljudske procjene koje razlikuju istorijski zadatak za sažetak modernog jezika od standardnog krstojezičkog sažetka (tj. modernog na modernom jeziku), istaknujemo razliku i vrijednost našeg seta podataka i pokazujemo da naš pristup prijenosa prijenosa iznosi standardne krstojezičke kritike na ovom zadatku.', 'si': 'අපි ඉතිහාසික පාළුව සංශ්\u200dයාපනයේ වැඩසටහන් පෙනුම් කරනවා, කොහෙද භාෂයේ ඉතිහාසික වර්ගයක් ලිපිණිය ස මේක ඉතිහාසකයෝ සහ ඩිජිටල් මානසිකයෝ පරීක්ෂකයෝ වෙනුවෙන් වැදගත් වැඩක් වෙනවා නමුත් කවදාවත් ස් අපි අවුරුදු සීයක් කලින් ඉතිහාසික ජර්මන් සහ චීනි වාර්තාවක් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ඉන්නවා. විශාල භාෂාවික සුද්ධානය ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජන විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dරයෝජන විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dරයෝජන විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dරයෝජන විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dරයෝජන විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dරයෝජන වි අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක සහ මිනිස්සු විශ්වාස කරනවා ඒ වගේම අධ්\u200dයාත්මක භාෂාව සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරනවා ප්\u200dරමාණය ක්\u200dරියාත්මක භාෂාව (ඉතින්, අධ්\u200dයාත්මක භාෂ', 'so': 'Shaqada taariikhda ah ayaannu soo bandhignaa, halkaas oo dukumentiyada ku qoran noocyada taariikhda ah oo luuqada luuqada lagu qorayo lagu soo qorayo luuqada hore oo la mid ah. Tani waa wado muhiim ah oo u dhexeeya taariikhda iyo cilmi-baaritaanka biniaadamka ee digital, laakiin weligeed lama sameyn. Waxaynu soo koobnaynaa taariikhda qoraalka kooxaha ah oo dahab-standard, kaas oo ka mid ah warqada taariikhda Jarmalka iyo Shiino ee ka soo horeeyey boqol sano oo ka horeysa lagu soo qoray Jarmalka ama Shiino. Sida lagu saleynayo qalabka waxbarashada ee luuqadaha kala duwan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa tusaale takhasuska ah oo lagu baran karo xittaa aan lagu baran karo macluumaad kala duwan (taariikhda ilaa modern) oo la simi karo, waxaana ka sii wadi karnaa qoraalka-qoriga ah. Waxaannu wargelinaynaa qiimeynta horumarinta ah iyo dadka oo kala soocaya shaqada taariikhda ah e e ugu qoran luuqada moderniinta, taas oo ka muuqata muuqashada iyo qiimaha aqoonta luuqadaha koronta ah (tusaale ahaan luqada hore ee modern), waxaana muujinaynaa in qaababka waxbarashada lagu beddelo uu sameeyo qiimeyaasha caadiga ah oo ku qoran luuqadan.', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar uppgiften med historisk textsammanfattning, där dokument i historiska former av ett språk sammanfattas på motsvarande moderna språk. Detta är en grundläggande rutin för historiker och forskare inom digital humaniora men har aldrig automatiserats. Vi sammanställer ett högkvalitativt textsammanfattningsdataset med guldstandard, som består av historiska tyska och kinesiska nyheter från hundratals år sedan sammanfattade på modern tyska eller kinesiska. Baserat på tvärspråkiga överföringsmetoder föreslår vi en sammanfattningsmodell som kan tränas även utan tvärspråkiga (historiska till moderna) parallella data, och ytterligare jämföra den mot state-of-the-art algoritmer. Vi rapporterar automatiska och mänskliga utvärderingar som skiljer den historiska till moderna språksammanfattningsuppgiften från standardtvärspråklig sammanfattning (dvs. modernt till modernt språk), belyser distinktionen och värdet av vår datauppsättning och visar att vår metod för överföring av lärande överträffar standardtvärspråkliga riktmärken för denna uppgift.', 'ta': 'நாம் வரலாற்று உரை சுருக்கம் செய்யும் பணியை அறிவிக்கிறோம், அதில் வரலாற்று வடிவத்தில் ஆவணங்கள் ஒரு மொழியின் பொருத்தமான அமர் இது வரலாற்றாளர்களுக்கும் இலக்கங்களுடைய ஆய்வுகளுக்கும் முக்கியமான வழிமுறை நாங்கள் ஒரு உயர்தரமான தங்கக்கூடிய நிலையான உரை சுருக்க தகவல் அமைப்பை தொகுக்குகிறோம், இது நூற்று வருடங்களுக்கு முன்பு நூறு வயது ஜெர்மன் அல் மொழி மொழி மாற்றும் கற்றல் தொழில்நுட்பத்தை அடிப்படையில், நாம் ஒரு சுருக்க மாதிரி மாதிரியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் அது குறுக்கீட்டு மாதிரி( வரலாற்று அமர்ந்த மொ நாங்கள் தானாகவே மற்றும் மனித மதிப்புகளை அறிவிக்கிறோம். வரலாற்று மற்றும் தற்போதைய மொழி சுருக்கும் பணியை பிரித்துக் கொள்கிறோம். நிலையான மொழி சுருக்கும் சேர்ப்பிலிருந்து, எங்கள் தரவுத', 'mn': 'Бид түүхийн текстүүдийн түүхийн түүхийн түүхийн хэлбэрүүдийн баримтуудыг илтгэдэг. Орчин үеийн хэл дээр харьцуулагддаг. Энэ бол түүхчдийн, дижитал хүн төрөлхтний судлаачдын үндсэн зүйл юм. Гэхдээ хэзээ ч автоматжуулагдаагүй. Бид хэдэн зуун жилийн өмнө Германы эсвэл Хятадын орчин үеийн Германы эсвэл Хятадын түүхийн мэдээлэл болон өндөр чанартай алтын стандарт хэмжээний өгөгдлийг цуглуулж байна. Бид хэлний шилжүүлэлтийн суралцах технологи дээр үндсэн, олон хэлний (түүх орчин үеийн) параллел өгөгдлийг багш суралцах боломжгүй жинхэнэ загварын загварыг санал болгож, урлагийн алгоритмын эсрэг үүнийг багш нарийвчлан үзүүлэх боломж Бид түүхийг орчин үеийн хэл дээр тодорхойлох үйлдлийг стандарт олон хэл дээр тодорхойлох (яг л орчин үеийн хэл дээр орчин үеийн хэл дээр), өгөгдлийн сангийн ялгаа болон үнэ цэнийг тодорхойлж, бидний шилжүүлэх үйлдлийн арга баримт нь энэ үйлдлийн талаар стандарт олон хэл хэл дээр тодо', 'ur': 'ہم تاریخی پیغام کی تعریف کے کام کو پیش کریں گے، جہاں ایک زبان کی تاریخی فرموں میں لکھائے جاتے ہیں، ان کی تعریف مدرنی زبان میں. یہ تاریخیوں اور دیجیتال انسانیت تحقیقات کرنے والوں کے لئے اہم طریقہ ہے لیکن ہرگز اتوماٹی نہیں کی گئی۔ ہم ایک عالی کیفیت سونے-استاندارڈ ٹیکسٹ جمع کرنا ڈیٹ سٹ کو جمع کرتے ہیں، جو تاریخی جرمن اور چینی خبریوں میں سے صدوں سال پہلے جرمن یا چینی میں جمع کیا گیا ہے۔ کروس زبان ترافس کی تعلیم کی تکنیک پر بنیاد ہے، ہم ایک سراسر موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو کروس زبان (تاریخ) کے بغیر مشابل ڈاٹے بھی نہیں کی جاتی، اور اسے آلگریٹم کے مقابلہ میں اضافہ کر سکتے ہیں. ہم اپنے ساتھ اور انسان کی ارزیابی کا گزارش کرتے ہیں جو تاریخی کی تاریخی کو مدرنی زبان کی ارزیابی کا کام (یعنی مدرنی زبان سے) متفرق کرتے ہیں (یعنی مدرنی زبان سے متفرق کرتے ہیں) اور ہمارے ڈاٹ سٹ کی فرق اور ارزش کو تفصیل دیتے ہیں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری ترنسیٹ سکونٹ کی طریقہ اس کام', 'kk': 'Біз тарихлық мәтін тұжырымдамасының тапсырмасын келтіреміз, қайда тілдің тарихлық түрлерінде құжаттар сәйкесті тілде тұжырымдамасы болады. Бұл тарихый және цифрлық гуманитарлық зерттеушілер үшін негізгі маңызды әртүрлі, бірақ ешқашан автоматты түрде қалмаған. Біз сапатты алтын- стандартты мәтін жинақтау деректерін компиляцияладық. Бұл жүздеген жылдан бұрын жүздеген неміс не қытайлық тілінде жинақталған журнал немец мен қытайлық жаңалықтард Артық тілді аудару оқыту техникасына негізделген, біз көпшілік тілді параллель деректері (тарихый және азырақ) емес деген және оны суреттердің алгоритмдеріне қарсы қолдану үлгісін қолданамыз. Автоматты және адамдардың оқиғаларын, тарихлық тілдерді көбірек тілдерді көбірек тілдерді көбірек түрлендіру тапсырмасынан түрлендіру тапсырмасын (т.е. көбірек тілде көбірек тілде), деректер жиынының айырмашылығын және мәнін белгілеу жә', 'no': 'Vi introduserer oppgåva til historisk tekstsamansering, der dokument i historiske formar av eit språk vert samansert i den tilsvarande moderne språket. Dette er ein grunnleggjande viktig rutin for historiane og digitale menneskeforskere, men har aldri blitt automatisert. Vi kompiler eit høg kvalitet gull-standard samansering av tekst, som inneheld historisk tysk og kinesisk nyhetar frå hundre år siden samansert i moderne tysk eller kinesisk. Basert på fleirspråk-læringsteknikk, foreslår vi eit sammendragingsmodell som kan trenjast sjølv med ingen krysspråk-parallelle data (historisk til moderne) og fleire benchmarker det mot kunstalgoritme. Vi rapporterer automatiske og menneske evalueringar som forskjeller historiske til modern e språkssamanseringsverkt frå standard krysspråk samansering (t.d. moderne til moderne språk), markerer ulikheten og verdien av datasettet våre, og demonstrerer at tilnærminga vårt overføringsverktøy utfører standardne krysspråk på denne oppgåva.', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu nhiệm vụ tóm tắt văn bản lịch sử, nơi những tài liệu trong dạng lịch sử của ngôn ngữ được liệt kê bằng ngôn ngữ hiện đại tương ứng. Đây là một thói quen quan trọng với lịch sử và các nhà nghiên cứu Nhân loại số nhưng chưa bao giờ được tự động. Chúng tôi soạn thảo một tập tin tổng hợp bằng vàng chất lượng cao, gồm các tin tức lịch sử của Đức và Trung Quốc từ hàng trăm năm trước được tổng hợp lại với Đức hay Trung Quốc hiện đại. Dựa trên kỹ thuật học chuyển nhượng ngôn ngữ khác nhau, chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình tóm tắt có thể được đào tạo mặc dù không có dữ liệu song song song song song song song lộ xuyên ngôn ngữ (lịch sử với hiện đại) và đánh giá nó dựa vào thuật to án hiện đại. Báo cáo đánh giá tự động và con người phân biệt nhiệm vụ tổng tóm tắt ngôn ngữ lịch sử với công nghệ hiện đại với tóm tắt ngôn ngữ thông thường (tức là ngôn ngữ hiện đại hoặc hiện đại), đánh dấu sự khác biệt và giá trị của bộ dữ liệu, và chứng minh phương pháp truyền tải của chúng ta đạt đạt tiêu chuẩn trên tiêu đề này.', 'uz': "Biz tarixiy matn muhtasifi ishni anglatamiz. Bu yerda tarixi shakllarda qoʻllanmalar o'z tilning qisqa yangi tilda hisoblanadi. Bu tarixi va raqamli inson o'qituvchilari uchun muhim yo'l, lekin hech qachon avtomatik o'rganilmagan. Biz yuqori darajada o'xshash gold-standard matn muhtasifi maʼlumotini kompyuter qilamiz. Bu bir necha yil avval yuzma Olmon yoki Xitoycha tilidagi tarixiy Olmon va Xitoycha xabar tarkibi. Ko'pchilik tillarni o'rganish texnologiga asosida, biz o'rganish muhim modelini o'rganish imkoniyatlarini o'rganish imkoniyatlarini o'rganish mumkin, balki har xil tillar (tarixiy to modern) parallel maʼlumot yoʻq, va yana davom etishga qarang. Biz tarixi va inson qiymatlarini avtomatik ravishda yangi tillar muhitirlarini o'zgartirib turamiz, oddiy tillarning andoza qiymatlarimizning soni va qiymatni koʻrsatish va o'rganishni o'rganish qiymatimizni ushbu vazifa uchun andoza tillarda qiymatlarini bajaradi.", 'da': 'Vi introducerer opgaven med historisk tekst opsummering, hvor dokumenter i historiske former af et sprog opsummeres på det tilsvarende moderne sprog. Dette er en grundlæggende vigtig rutine for historikere og digitale humanistiske forskere, men er aldrig blevet automatiseret. Vi udarbejder et datasæt af høj kvalitet, der indeholder historiske tyske og kinesiske nyheder fra hundreder af år siden sammenfattet på moderne tysk eller kinesisk. Baseret på tværsprogede overførselsteknikker foreslår vi en sammenfattende model, der kan trænes selv uden tværsprogede (historiske til moderne) parallelle data, og yderligere benchmark den mod state-of-the-art algoritmer. Vi rapporterer automatiske og menneskelige evalueringer, der skelner mellem den historiske og moderne sprogopsummeringsopgave og standardopsummering på tværs af sprog (dvs. moderne til moderne sprog), fremhæver tydeligheden og værdien af vores datasæt og viser, at vores overførselsindlæring overstiger standard tværsprogede benchmarks på denne opgave.', 'bg': 'Въвеждаме задачата за обобщаване на исторически текстове, където документите в исторически форми на даден език са обобщени на съответния съвременен език. Това е фундаментално важна рутина за историците и изследователите на цифровите хуманитарни науки, но никога не е била автоматизирана. Ние съставяме висококачествен златен стандарт текстово обобщение набор от данни, който се състои от исторически немски и китайски новини от преди стотици години обобщени на съвременен немски или китайски език. Въз основа на техники за трансферно обучение, предлагаме модел на обобщаване, който може да бъде обучен дори без междуезични (исторически към модерни) паралелни данни, и допълнително да го сравни с най-съвременните алгоритми. Докладваме автоматични и човешки оценки, които разграничават историческата задача за обобщаване на съвременния език от стандартното междуезично обобщаване (т.е. модерен към модерен език), подчертават разграничението и стойността на нашия набор от данни и демонстрират, че нашият подход за трансферно обучение надминава стандартните междуезични референтни показатели за тази задача.', 'nl': 'We introduceren de taak van historische tekstsamenvatting, waarbij documenten in historische vormen van een taal worden samengevat in de overeenkomstige moderne taal. Dit is een fundamenteel belangrijke routine voor historici en onderzoekers van digitale geesteswetenschappen, maar is nooit geautomatiseerd. We stellen een hoogwaardige goudstandaard tekstsamenvattingsdataset samen, die bestaat uit historisch Duits en Chinees nieuws van honderden jaren geleden samengevat in modern Duits of Chinees. Op basis van cross-lingual transfer learning technieken stellen we een samenvattingsmodel voor dat zelfs zonder cross-lingual (historisch tot modern) parallelle data getraind kan worden en verder benchmarken met state-of-the-art algoritmes. We rapporteren automatische en menselijke evaluaties die de historische tot moderne samenvattingstaak onderscheiden van standaard meertalige samenvatting (d.w.z. moderne naar moderne taal), benadrukken het onderscheid en de waarde van onze dataset en tonen aan dat onze transfer learning aanpak overtreft standaard meertalige benchmarks op deze taak.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo zadatak sažetka istorijskog teksta, gdje su dokumenti u istorijskim oblicima jezika sažeti u odgovarajućem modernom jeziku. Ovo je temeljno važna rutina za istoričare i istraživače digitalne ljudskosti, ali nikada nije automatski. Kompiliramo skupinu podataka o sumiranju zlatnog standardnog teksta, koja se sastoji od istorijskih njemačkih i kineskih vijesti prije stotina godina, sažeta na modernom njemačkom ili kineskom. Na temelju tehnika učenja međujezičkih transfer a, predlažemo model za sažetak koji se može obučiti čak i bez međujezičkih (istorijskih do modernih) paralelnih podataka, i daljnje je navodimo protiv algoritma stanja umjetnosti. Prijavljujemo automatske i ljudske procjene koje razlikuju povijesni zadatak za sažetak modernog jezika od standardnog krstojezičkog sažetka (tj. modernog na modernom jeziku), naglašavamo različitost i vrijednost našeg seta podataka i pokazujemo da naš pristup učenja prijenosa iznosi standardne međujezičke kritike na ovom zadatku.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan tugas dari penglihatan teks sejarah, di mana dokumen dalam bentuk sejarah bahasa dikumpulkan dalam bahasa modern yang sesuai. Ini adalah rutin yang sangat penting bagi sejarah dan peneliti kemanusiaan digital tapi belum pernah otomatis. Kami mengumpulkan data ringkasan teks standar emas yang berkualitas tinggi, yang terdiri dari berita sejarah Jerman dan Cina dari ratusan tahun yang lalu ringkasan dalam bahasa Jerman atau Cina modern. Berdasarkan teknik pembelajaran trans-bahasa transfer, kami mengusulkan model ringkasan yang dapat dilatih bahkan tanpa data paralel trans-bahasa (sejarah ke modern), dan lebih lanjut benchmark terhadap algoritma-state-of-the-art. Kami melaporkan evaluasi otomatis dan manusia yang membedakan tugas ringkasan bahasa sejarah ke modern dari ringkasan bahasa-bahasa standar (i.e., bahasa modern ke modern), mempertimbangkan perbedaan dan nilai dataset kami, dan menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan belajar transfer kita melebihi benchmark transbahasa standar dalam tugas ini.', 'de': 'Wir stellen die Aufgabe der historischen Textzusammenfassung vor, bei der Dokumente in historischen Formen einer Sprache in der entsprechenden modernen Sprache zusammengefasst werden. Diese Routine ist für Historiker und Digital Humanities Forscher von grundlegender Bedeutung, wurde aber nie automatisiert. Wir erstellen einen hochwertigen Goldstandard-Textzusammenfassungsdatensatz, der aus historischen deutschen und chinesischen Nachrichten aus Hunderten von Jahren besteht, zusammengefasst in modernem Deutsch oder Chinesisch. Basierend auf sprachübergreifenden Transfer-Lerntechniken schlagen wir ein Zusammenfassungsmodell vor, das auch ohne sprachübergreifende (historische bis moderne) parallele Daten trainiert werden kann, und vergleichen es mit modernsten Algorithmen. Wir berichten über automatische und menschliche Auswertungen, die die historische bis moderne Sprachzusammenfassungsaufgabe von der standardmäßigen sprachübergreifenden Zusammenfassung unterscheiden (d.h. moderne Sprache), die Unterscheidbarkeit und den Wert unseres Datensatzes hervorheben und zeigen, dass unser Transferlernansatz bei dieser Aufgabe die üblichen sprachübergreifenden Benchmarks übertrifft.', 'ko': '우리는 역사 텍스트 총결의 임무, 즉 상응하는 현대 언어로 언어의 역사 형식을 총결하는 문서를 소개할 것이다.역사학자와 디지털 인문 연구원들에게 이것은 매우 중요한 일반적인 작업이지만 자동화를 실현한 적이 없다.우리는 수백 년 전의 역사 독일어와 중국어 뉴스를 포함하여 현대 독일어나 중국어로 요약한 고품질의 금 표준 텍스트 요약 데이터 집합을 번역했다.크로스 언어 이동 학습 기술을 바탕으로 우리는 크로스 언어(역사에서 현대까지) 병행 데이터가 없어도 훈련할 수 있는 총결 모델을 제시하고 이를 가장 선진적인 알고리즘과 비교했다.우리는 자동과 인공 평가를 보고하여 역사에서 현대까지의 언어 총결 임무와 표준 크로스 언어 총결(즉 현대에서 현대까지의 언어)을 구분하고 데이터 집합의 독특성과 가치를 강조하며 우리의 이동 학습 방법이 이 임무에서 표준 크로스 언어 기준보다 우수하다는 것을 증명했다.', 'sw': 'We introduce the task of historical text summarisation, where documents in historical forms of a language are summarised in the corresponding modern language.  Hii ni njia muhimu kwa watafiti wa kihistoria na wanadamu wa kidigitali lakini haijawahi kuanzishwa. Tunaweza kukusanya taarifa za muhtasari wa maandishi ya dhahabu yenye kiwango cha juu, ambazo ni pamoja na habari za kihistoria za Kijerumani na Kichina kutoka mamia ya miaka iliyopita zilizosimamiwa katika lugha ya Kijerumani au Kichina. Kutokana na mbinu za kuhamisha elimu kwa lugha mbalimbali, tunapendekeza modeli ya muhtasari ambayo inaweza kufundishwa hata bila ya taarifa za kisiasa (historia hadi sasa) za usambazaji, na kuingiza zaidi dhidi ya algorithi za hali ya sanaa. Tunatoa taarifa za tathmini za kimataifa na binadamu zinazotofautiana na kazi za muhtasari wa lugha za kisasa kutoka kwa muhtasari wa msingi wa lugha za kawaida (yaani lugha ya sasa na ya kisasa), zinaonyesha utofauti na thamani ya seti ya taarifa zetu, na kuonyesha kwamba mbinu zetu za kujifunza zinaonyesha misingi ya kawaida za lugha kwa kiasi kikubwa katika kazi hii.', 'af': "Ons introduseer die taak van historiese teks opsomming waar dokumente in historiese vorms van 'n taal opsomming word in die ooreenstemmende moderne taal. Hierdie is 'n fundamenteel belangrike rutin vir historiërs en digitale menslike ondersoekers, maar het nooit outomatiese geword nie. Ons kompiler 'n hoë-kwaliteit goud-standaard teks opsomming dataset, wat bestaan van historiese Duits en Sjinese nuus van honderd jaar gelede opsomming in moderne Duits of Sjinees. Ons bevestig op kruistale oordrag onderwerp teknike 'n opsomming model wat selfs met geen kruistale (historie tot moderne) parallele data kan onderwerp word nie, en verdere benchmark dit teen staat-van-kuns-algoritme. Ons rapporteer outomatiese en menslike evaluasies wat die historiese tot modern e taal opsomming taak verkies van standaard kruistale opsomming (i.e. moderne tot moderne taal), verlig die eienskaplike en waarde van ons datastel, en wys dat ons oordrag onderwerp onderwerp onderwerp onderwerp standaard kruistale benchmarke op hierdie taak uitvoer.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim detyrën e përmbledhjes së tekstit historik, ku dokumentet në forma historike të një gjuhe përmbledhen në gjuhën moderne korrespondente. Kjo është një rutinë thelbësisht e rëndësishme për historianët dhe kërkuesit e njerëzimit dixhitale por nuk është automatizuar kurrë. Ne mbledhim një grup të dhënash të përmbledhjes së tekstit të standartit të artë të cilësisë së lartë, i cili përbëhet nga lajmet historike gjermane dhe kineze nga qindra vjet më parë të përmbledhur në gjermane moderne apo kineze. Bazuar në teknikat e transferimit ndërgjuhësor të mësimit, ne propozojmë një model të përmbledhjes që mund të trajnohet edhe pa të dhëna paralele ndërgjuhësore (historike në moderne) dhe të paraqitet më tej kundër algoritmeve më të moderne. Ne raportojmë vlerësime automatike dhe njerëzore që dallojnë detyrën historike dhe modern e të përmbledhjes së gjuhës nga përmbledhje standarte ndërgjuhësore (pra, gjuhë moderne deri modern), theksojmë dallimin dhe vlerën e grupit tonë të dhënash dhe demonstrojmë se metoda jonë e mësimit të transferimit ekziston në këtë detyrë norma referuese ndërgjuhësore.', 'fa': 'ما وظیفه\u200cی جمع کردن متن تاریخی را معرفی می\u200cکنیم، جایی که مدارک در شکل تاریخی یک زبان در زبان مدرن تعریف می\u200cشود. این یک روش بنیادی مهم برای تاریخیان و محققان انسانیت دیجیتال است ولی هیچ وقت اتوماتیک نشده است. ما یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای جمع کردن آلمانی و چینی از صدها سال پیش در آلمانی یا چینی مدرن با کیفیت طلا استاندارد را ترکیب می\u200cکنیم. بر اساس تکنیک انتقال متوسط زبان، ما یک مدل ذخیره\u200cسازی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که حتی بدون داده\u200cهای متوسط زبان (تاریخی به مدرن) متوسط آموزش می\u200cشود، و آن را بر خلاف الگوریتم\u200cهای موقعیت هنر ترکیب می\u200cکنیم. ما ارزیابی\u200cهای خودکار و انسانی را گزارش می\u200cدهیم که وظیفه تاریخی را به فصل جمع کردن زبان مدرن از جمع کردن متوسط زبان استاندارد (یعنی مدرن به زبان مدرن) تفصیل و ارزش داده\u200cهای ما را تفصیل می\u200cدهند، و نشان می\u200cدهیم که روش آموزش یادگیری ما در این وظیفه متوسط', 'am': 'ታሪካዊ የጽሑፍ አቀማመጥ ማድረግ እናስገራለን፤ ታሪካዊ ቋንቋ ውስጥ ሰነዶች በአዲስ ቋንቋ በተለየ አዲስ ቋንቋ ሲታወሱ፡፡ ይህ ለታሪክ እና ለዲጂተል ሰብዓዊ አስተማሪዎች የተጠቃሚ ጉዳይ ነው፣ ግን ማንኛውም አልተገኘም፡፡ ከመቶ ዓመታት በፊት በጀርመን ጀምሮ ታሪክ ጀርመን ጀምሮ የቻይና ዜናዎች የተደረገ የኮርማዊ የወርቅ ድርቅ-standard የጽሑፍ ማሳተሚያ ድረጉን አሰራጅተናል፡፡ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ትምህርት ማቀናቀል በተደረገ፣ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ (ታሪክ እስከ አሁኑ ድረስ ታሪክ) ተያያያዊ ዳታዎችን ባይማሩ እና በአገሪካ-የዓርድ አልgorithም ላይ ማስተምር የሚችለውን ማስታወቂያ ሞዴል እናስገድዳለን፡፡ ታሪክ እና አዲስ ቋንቋ ማሳየት አድራሻ (አዲስ ቋንቋ) የሚለየውን ታሪካ እና የሰው ማስታወቂያውን እናስታውቃለን፤ የዳታ ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ እና ዋጋ ማሳየትን እና ለመለወጥ ትምህርታችንን ማቀናቀፍ ግንኙነት በዚህ ስራ ላይ የድጋፍ ቋንቋ ክፍተቶችን እንዲያሳየው እናስታውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք պատմական տեքստի համառոտագրման խնդիրը, որտեղ փաստաթղթերը լեզվի պատմական ձևերով համառոտագրվում են համապատասխան ժամանակակից լեզվին: Սա հիմնականում կարևոր սովորույթ է պատմաբանների և թվային մարդկային գիտությունների հետազոտողների համար, բայց երբեք չի ավտոմացվել: Մենք կազմում ենք բարձր որակի ոսկու ստանդարտ տեքստի համառոտագրման տվյալներ, որոնք կազմված են գերմանական և չինական պատմական նորություններից հարյուրավոր տարիներ առաջ, համառոտագրված ժամանակակից գերմանական կամ չինական լեզվով: Հաշվի առնելով լեզվային փոխանցման ուսումնասիրության մեթոդներին, մենք առաջարկում ենք համառոտագրման մոդել, որը կարող է կրթություն ունենալ նույնիսկ առանց երկլեզվային (պատմական մինչև ժամանակակից) զուգահեռ տվյալների, և ավելի շատ համեմատել այն նորագույն ալգորիթմների հետ: Մենք զեկուցում ենք ավտոմատիկ և մարդկային գնահատումներ, որոնք տարբերակում են պատմական և ժամանակակից լեզվի համառոտագրման խնդիրը ստանդարտ երկլեզվային համառոտագրման (այսինքն, ժամանակակից մինչև ժամանակակից լեզվի), շեշտում են մեր տվյալների համակարգի տարբերությունը և արժեքը և ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր փոխանցման ուսումնական մոտեցումը գերազանցում', 'bn': 'আমরা ঐতিহাসিক টেক্সটের সারসংক্ষেপের কাজ পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি, যেখানে ঐতিহাসিক ভাষায় একটি ভাষার ঐতিহাসিক ভাষায় নথিপত্রের এটা ঐতিহাসিক এবং ডিজিটাল মানবিক গবেষকের জন্য মৌলিক একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ রুটিন, কিন্তু কখনোই স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে  আমরা আধুনিক জার্মান অথবা চীনের মধ্যে সারসংক্ষিপ্ত ঐতিহাসিক জার্মান এবং চীনা সংবাদ সংক্রান্ত তথ্য সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষিপ্ত একটি উচ্চ মান ক্রিভাষাভাষী শিক্ষা প্রযুক্তির পরিবর্তনের ভিত্তিতে আমরা একটি সংক্ষিপ্ত মডেল প্রস্তাব করি যা কোনো ক্রাস্ট্রিভাষার (ঐতিহাসিক থেকে আধুনিক) প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান কর আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে এবং মানুষের মূল্য প্রতিবেদন প্রদান করি যা ঐতিহাসিক ভাষার সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপের কাজ থেকে বিচ্ছিন্ন করে (যেমন আধুনিক ভাষা), আমাদের ডাটাসেটের বৈচিত্র্য এবং মূল্য উল্ল', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo zadatak sažetka istorijskog teksta, gdje su dokumenti u istorijskim oblicima jezika sažeti u odgovarajućem modernom jeziku. Ovo je osnovno važna rutina za istoričare i istraživače digitalne ljudskosti, ali nikada nije automatski. Kompiliramo skupinu podataka o sumiranju zlatnog standardnog teksta, koja se sastoji od istorijskih njemačkih i kineskih vijesti prije stotina godina, sažeta na modernom njemačkom ili kineskom. Na temelju tehnika učenja međujezičkih transfer a, predlažemo model rezimetiranja koji se može obučiti čak i bez međujezičkih (istorijskih do modernih) paralelnih podataka, i daljnje je navodimo protiv algoritma stanja umjetnosti. Prijavljujemo automatske i ljudske procjene koje razlikuju povijesni zadatak za sažetak modernog jezika od standardnog krstojezičkog sažetka (tj. modernog na modernom jeziku), istaknemo različitost i vrijednost našeg seta podataka i pokazuju da naš pristup za učenje prijenosa iznosi standardne međujezičke kritike na ovom zadatku.', 'az': 'Biz tarihi metin təmizlənməsinin işini tanıdırırıq ki, bir dilin tarihi formlarında belələr müəyyən edilən modern dildə təmizlənir. Bu, tarixçilər və dijital insanlıq araştırmalarına əslində mövcuddur, amma heç vaxt automatsız edilməmişdir. Biz yüksək kaliteli altın-standart metin toplama verilənlərini birləşdiririk. Bu, yüzlərlə il əvvəl modern Alman ya da Çin olaraq yığıldığı tarihi Alman və Çin xəbərlərindəndir. Çift dilləri öyrənmə tekniklərinə dayanan, çoxlu dil paralel məlumatları olmadan hətta öyrənə biləcək qurbanlıq modeli təklif edirik və art ıq onu sanat algoritminin durumu ilə dəyişdiririk. Biz təhsil və insan qiymətlərini, tarixini modern i dil qiymətindən ayırd edən standart çox dil qiymətindən (məsələn, moderni dillərə, moderni dillərə), veri qutuğumuzun farklılığını və qiymətini təşrifləyirik, və bizim təhsil öyrənmə metodumunun bu i şdə standart çox dil qiymətlərinin üstünlüyünü göstərir.', 'ca': "Introduïm la tasca de resumir el text històric, on els documents en formes històriques d'una llengua es resumen en la llengua modern a correspondent. Aquesta és una rutina fonamentalment important per als historiadors i investigadors en humanitats digitals però mai ha estat automatitzada. Recopilem un conjunt de dades de sumarització de text d'alta qualitat, que consisteix en notícies històriques alemanyes i xineses de fa centenars d'anys resumida en alemanès o xinès moderns. Sobre la base de tècniques d'aprenentatge translingüístic de transfer ència, proposem un model de resum que pot ser entrenat fins i tot sense dades paralleles translingüístices (històriques a modernes), i encara més comparar-la amb algoritmes més avançats. Informem d'evaluacions automàtiques i humanes que distingeixen la tasca històrica i moderna de resum de llenguatges de resum translingüístic estándar (és a dir, llenguatge modern a modern), destaquen la distinció i el valor del nostre conjunt de dades i demostren que el nostre enfocament d'aprenentatge de transfer ència supera els punts de referència translingüístics estándar d'aquesta tasca.", 'tr': 'Biz taryhy metin hulatynyň buýrukyny çykarýarys, ol ýerde geçmiş dilleriň taryhy şeklinde gurnalýar. Bu taryhçylar we dijital adamlaryň bardyklary üçin esasy wajypdyr, ýöne hiç haçan awtomatik edilmedi. Biz beýik-kaliteli altyn-standart metin toplamyny ýygnaýarys. Bu da dünýädäki nemesçe we hyt dilinden ýüzlerçe ýyl mundan öň jemgyýetlenýän täzeliklerdir. Çapraz diller öwrenmek tekniklerine dayanan, cross-lingual (taryha modern) parallel maglumatlary ýok üçin we muny sungat algoritmalaryna garşy çykarmak üçin bir topar nusgasyny teklip edýäris. Biz öz-özümize we adamlaryň baýramlaryny günümizdeki diller jemgyýetişdirýän täzeliklerini standart çerçe-diller jemgyýetişdirýän täzeliklerden (meselâ, modern dillere), veri setiminiň üýtgeşiklerini we deňliklerini ýagtylaýan we biziň transfers öwrenmegimizin bu täzelikde standart çerçe-diller netijesinde ç', 'cs': 'Představujeme úkol shrnutí historických textů, kde jsou dokumenty v historických formách jazyka shrnuty v odpovídajícím moderním jazyce. To je zásadně důležitá rutina pro historiky a výzkumníky digitálních humanitních věd, ale nikdy nebyla automatizována. Sestavujeme vysoce kvalitní soubor textových shrnutí, který se skládá z historických německých a čínských zpráv před stovkami let shrnutých v moderní němčině nebo čínštině. Na základě metod transferového učení mezi jazyky navrhujeme souhrnný model, který lze trénovat i bez paralelních dat mezi jazyky (historických až moderních) a dále jej porovnat s nejmodernějšími algoritmy. Zaznamenáváme automatická a lidská hodnocení, která odlišují historický až moderní úkol shrnutí jazyků od standardního shrnutí více jazyků (tj. moderní k modernímu jazyku), zdůrazňují odlišnost a hodnotu našich datových souborů a demonstrují, že náš přístup k transferovému učení překonává standardní mezijazyčné referenční hodnoty pro tento úkol.', 'et': 'Tutvustame ajaloolise teksti kokkuvõtte ülesannet, kus dokumendid ajaloolises keeles on kokku võetud vastavas kaasaegses keeles. See on ajaloolastele ja digitaalse humanitaarteaduse teadlastele põhimõtteliselt oluline rutiin, kuid seda pole kunagi automatiseeritud. Koostame kvaliteetse kuldstandardi tekstikokkuvõtte andmekogumi, mis koosneb sajade aastate tagustest ajaloolistest saksa ja hiina uudistest, mis on kokku võetud tänapäeva saksa või hiina keeles. Keeleülese siirdeõppe tehnikatele tuginedes pakume välja kokkuvõtlusmudeli, mida saab koolitada isegi ilma keeleüleste (ajalooliste ja kaasaegsete) paralleelsete andmeteta, ning võrdleme seda veelgi kaasaegsete algoritmidega. Arutame automaatseid ja inimlikke hinnanguid, mis eristavad ajaloolise ja kaasaegse keele kokkuvõtte ülesannet standardsest keeleülesest kokkuvõttest (st kaasaegsest kuni kaasaegse keeleni), rõhutavad meie andmekogumi eristatavust ja väärtust ning näitavad, et meie siirdeõppe lähenemisviis ületab selle ülesande puhul standardseid keeleüleseid võrdlusnorme.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme historiallisen tekstin yhteenvedon tehtävän, jossa kielen historiallisissa muodoissa olevat asiakirjat tiivistetään vastaavalla nykyaikaisella kielellä. Tämä on historioitsijoille ja digitaalisten humanististen tieteiden tutkijoille perustavanlaatuisen tärkeä rutiini, mutta sitä ei ole koskaan automatisoitu. Kokoamme korkealaatuisen kultaisen tekstin yhteenvetoaineiston, joka koostuu satojen vuosien takaisista saksalaisista ja kiinalaisista historiallisista uutisista, jotka on tiivistetty nykysaksaksi tai kiinaksi. Monikielisiin siirtooppimistekniikoihin perustuen ehdotamme yhteenvetomallia, jota voidaan kouluttaa myös ilman monikielistä (historiallisesta moderniin) rinnakkaisdataa, ja vertaamme sitä edelleen uusimpiin algoritmeihin. Raportoimme automaattisia ja inhimillisiä arviointeja, jotka erottavat historiallisen ja modernin kielen yhteenvedon tavallisesta monikielisestä yhteenvedosta (eli modernista nykykieleen), korostavat aineistomme erottuvuutta ja arvoa ja osoittavat, että siirtooppimisen lähestymistapamme ylittää standardit monikieliset vertailuarvot tässä tehtävässä.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים את המשימה של סכם טקסט היסטורי, שבו מסמכים בצורות היסטוריות של שפה מסומנים בשפה המודרנית המתאימה. זו שגרה חשובה בסיסית עבור היסטוריונים וחקרי אנושיות דיגיטליים, אבל מעולם לא הופעלה באוטומטית. אנו אוספים קבוצת נתונים של תיאור טקסט סטנדרטי זהב של איכות גבוהה, שמכילה בחדשות היסטוריות גרמניות וסיניות ממאות שנה לפני שנה בהתבסס על טכניקות הלימודים של העברה דרך שפתיים, אנו מציעים מודל של סאמריזציה שאפשר לאמן אפילו בלי נתונים משותפים דרך שפתיים (היסטוריים עד מודרניים), ולהתייחס נוסף אליו נגד אלגוריתמים חדשים. אנו מדווחים על ערכות אוטומטיות ואנושיות שמפרדים את משימה ההיסטורית לשפה המודרנית מהשיפוט הצלבי השפתי הסטנדרטי (כלומר, שפה מודרנית עד מודרנית), שמדגישים את הבדל והערך של קבוצת הנתונים שלנו, ומוכיחים שגישת הלימוד העברה שלנו עולה על נקודות רמזים הצלביים השפתיים הסטנדרטיות על המשימה הזאת.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo nalogo povzetka zgodovinskega besedila, kjer so dokumenti v zgodovinskih oblikah jezika povzeti v ustreznem sodobnem jeziku. To je temeljno pomembna rutina za zgodovinarje in raziskovalce digitalne humanistike, vendar nikoli ni bila avtomatizirana. Sestavljamo visokokakovosten nabor besedilnih povzetkov z zlatim standardom, ki je sestavljen iz zgodovinskih nemških in kitajskih novic pred več sto leti, povzetih v sodobni nemščini ali kitajščini. Na podlagi tehnik medjezičnega prenosa učenja predlagamo model povzetka, ki ga je mogoče trenirati tudi brez medjezičnih (zgodovinskih do sodobnih) vzporednih podatkov, in ga še naprej primerjamo z najsodobnejšimi algoritmi. Poročamo o avtomatičnih in človeških ocenah, ki razlikujejo zgodovinsko in sodobno nalogo povzemanja jezikov od standardnega medjezičnega povzemanja (tj. sodobnega do sodobnega jezika), poudarjajo razlikovanje in vrednost našega nabora podatkov ter dokazujejo, da naš pristop prenosnega učenja presega standardne medjezične referenčne vrednosti pri tej nalogi.', 'ha': "Tuna fara aikin littãfin na historian, inda duk takardar cikin kwanan wata na'ura na harshen, za'a ƙara cikin harshen da ke daidaita. Wannan wata shiryarwa na muhimu zuwa historian da mutane na digitali, kuma ba za'a farata ba. Tuna samun data na ƙararin littãfin na rubutu, mai kyakkyawan inganci na nauyi, wanda ke haɗa na historical jeruman da China daga shekarar shẽkaru da aka ƙara a cikin jeruman nan ko kuma na China. Basic kan masu motsi da aka motsi cikin harshen-ɗabi'a, muna goyyade wata motsi mai ƙidãya wanda za'a iya yin wa're-wa'a ko kuma bã da data masu fassarar-linguin (historical zuwa yanzu) kuma ka ƙara bangi shi a kan-state-of-the-art algoritm. Tuna buga ƙidãya farat-farat da mutum da ke rarraba aikin kurarin cikin harshen yanzu daga kure na'urar-kure na'ura (misali, harshen yanzu zuwa na yanzu), kuma munã nuna rarrabar da kimar da tsarin danahanmu, kuma masu nuna cewa hanyarmu na muhimmanci da za'a shige shi, za'a samar da kimada na ɗabi'ar-harshen na'ura a kan wannan aikin.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggawe langgar tarjamahan kanggo resmi dadi nggawe Iki iku, akeh sing paling dhuwur kuwi nggunakake kapan kanggo sabanjuré kamulyan karo perbudhakan Digital kuwi, njuk saiki durung ono wektu bisa otomatik. Awak dhéwé mulasah akeh-kaliwat akeh-awak dhéwé, dadi sing sembarang awak dhéwé ning alam lan basa Hyane kuwi padha setujuran kanggo ngerggo alam kuwi padha setujuran kanggo ngerggo alam dhéwé. Basa nang karo-dilangul transfer teknik, kita supoyo sistem dadi sumulasi model sing bisa ditambah karo perusahaan karo perusahaan (yatayakno kanggo modèrn) dadi yang karo perusahaan, lan akeh nggawe lanjut dhéwé kuwi state-of-the-arts Algorithms. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem lan nggambar perbudhakan kanggo nggambar tarjamahan kanggo nggambar nglanggar tarjamahan kanggo nggambar nggambar kehidupan (i.e. nampulan kanggo langkung karo modèrn), nglanggar nggambar aturan karo nggambar nggo dataset dhéwé, lan nglanggar nggambar uwong sing ngendalikno awak dhéwé, iso nglanggar tarjamahan kanggo nggawe tarjamahan kanggo', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ལོ་རྒྱུས་ཀྱི་ཡིག་གི་བཅུད་སྡུད་མངོན་གསལ་བཀོད་བྱས་པའི་བྱ་འགུལ་མངོན་གསལ་བཤད་བྱེད་དགོས། དེ་ནི་སྐད་རི འདི་ནི་ལོ་རྒྱུས་པོ་དང་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཆོས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པའི་སྲོལ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་དག་གི་ཉེན་རྐྱེན་ཅིག་རེད། ཡིན་ ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་པ་ལྟ་བུའི་མཐོ་རིམ་དང་ཐོག་འགོད་རིམ་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཕྲེང་མཐོང་མང་པོ་ཞིག་སྒྲིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Based on cross-lingual transfer learning techniques, we propose a summarization model that can be trained even with no cross-lingual (historical to modern) parallel data, and further benchmark it against state-of-the-art algorithms. ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ'}
{'en': 'Challenges in Automated Debiasing for Toxic Language Detection', 'ar': 'التحديات في إزالة الحواف الآلية لاكتشاف اللغة السامة', 'es': 'Desafíos del debiasing automatizado para la detección de lenguajes tóxicos', 'fr': 'Défis liés au débiais automatique pour la détection de langage toxique', 'pt': 'Desafios no Debiasing Automatizado para Detecção de Linguagem Tóxica', 'ja': '有毒言語検出のための自動デビアシングの課題', 'zh': '毒语自偏移挑战', 'hi': 'विषाक्त भाषा का पता लगाने के लिए स्वचालित Debiasing में चुनौतियां', 'ru': 'Проблемы в автоматизированном дебиасинге для обнаружения токсичного языка', 'ga': 'Dúshláin sa Díchlaonadh Uathoibrithe chun Teanga Tocsaineach a Bhrath', 'hu': 'Kihívások a mérgező nyelvek detektálásához szükséges automatizált tárgyalásokban', 'el': 'Προκλήσεις στην αυτοματοποιημένη απομάκρυνση για την ανίχνευση τοξικής γλώσσας', 'ka': 'ტექსიკური ენის განსახულებისთვის ავტომატიკური Debiasing', 'it': 'Sfide nel Debiasing automatizzato per la rilevazione del linguaggio tossico', 'kk': 'Токсикалық тілді анықтау үшін автоматты түрде Debiasing шақырулары', 'mk': 'Предизвики во автоматското дебијазирање за детекција на токсичен јазик', 'lt': 'Iššūkiai, susiję su automatiniu toksiškos kalbos nustatymu', 'ms': 'Challenges in Automated Debiasing for Toxic Language Detection', 'ml': 'ടോക്സിക്സിക്ക് ഭാഷ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സ്വയമായ ഡെബിസിങ്ങിലെ സങ്കീര്\u200dണങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mn': 'Токсик хэл тогтоохын тулд автоматжуулсан Debiasing-ын шаардлага', 'no': 'Utfordringar i automatisk debiasing for toksisk språk', 'ro': 'Provocări în dezbaterea automată pentru detectarea limbajului toxic', 'sr': 'Izazovi u automatskoj Debiasing za otkrivanje toksičkog jezika', 'mt': 'Sfidi fid-Debijar Awtomatiku għad-Detezzjoni tal-Lingwi Tossiċi', 'so': 'Challenges in Automated Debiasing for Toxic language Detection', 'si': 'ටොක්සික් භාෂාව හොයාගන්න සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විදිහට ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විදිහට දෙබියාස්', 'pl': 'Wyzwania w zautomatyzowanym debiazowaniu dla wykrywania toksycznego języka', 'ur': 'ٹاکسیک زبان شناسایی کے لئے آٹوٹی دبیزانگ میں چالج', 'sv': 'Utmaningar i automatiserad Debiasing för toxisk språkidentifiering', 'ta': 'தொகுதி மொழி கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான தன்னியக்கமாக நீக்குதலில் சவால்கள்', 'vi': 'Thử thách tại Automated Debelzaq... phát hiện độc ngôn ngữ.', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Предизвикателства при автоматизираното дебиазиране за откриване на токсични езици', 'nl': 'Uitdagingen in geautomatiseerde debiasing voor toxische taaldetectie', 'hr': 'Izazovi u automatskom Debiasing za otkrivanje toksičkog jezika', 'da': 'Udfordringer i automatiseret debiasing til detektion af giftige sprog', 'de': 'Herausforderungen beim automatisierten Debiasing für die Erkennung toxischer Sprache', 'id': 'tantangan dalam Debiasing Otomatis untuk Deteksi Bahasa Toksik', 'ko': '유독 언어 검출에 사용되는 자동 차용에 직면한 도전', 'fa': 'چالش\u200cها در بازرسی زبان تاکسیکی خودکار', 'tr': 'Toksik Dili Aňlamak üçin otomatik Debiasing Çözümleri', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Changamoto katika Kujitoleza kwa Kutambua Lugha za Kikosiki', 'sq': 'Sfidat në diskutimin automatik për zbulimin e gjuhës toksike', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Toksik dili keÅŸfetmÉ™si Ă¼Ă§Ă¼n Avtomatik Debiasing sÉ™bÉ™bi', 'hy': 'Տոքսիկ լեզուների հայտնաբերման ավտոմացված քննարկումների մարտահրավերները', 'bn': 'টোক্সিকো ভাষা সনাক্ত করার জন্য স্বয়ংক্রিয় ডিবিয়াসের চ্যালেঞ্জ', 'ca': 'Els reptes en la detecció automàtica de llengües tòxics', 'cs': 'Výzvy v automatizovaném debiazování pro detekci toxického jazyka', 'bs': 'Izazovi u automatskom Debiasing za otkrivanje toksičkog jezika', 'et': 'Mürgiste keelte tuvastamise automatiseeritud arutelu väljakutsed', 'fi': 'Automatisoidun väittelyn haasteet myrkyllisten kielten havaitsemisessa', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Izzivi pri avtomatiziranem odkrivanju strupenih jezikov', 'he': 'אתגרים בחקירה אוטומטית לגלות שפות רעילות', 'jv': 'deep', 'bo': 'Toxic Language Detection in Automated Debiasing for Challenges for Toxic Language Detection'}
{'en': 'Biased associations have been a challenge in the development of classifiers for detecting toxic language, hindering both fairness and accuracy. As potential solutions, we investigate recently introduced debiasing methods for text classification datasets and models, as applied to toxic language detection. Our focus is on lexical (e.g., swear words, slurs, identity mentions) and dialectal markers (specifically African American English). Our comprehensive experiments establish that existing methods are limited in their ability to prevent biased behavior in current toxicity detectors. We then propose an automatic, dialect-aware data correction method, as a proof-of-concept. Despite the use of synthetic labels, this method reduces dialectal associations with toxicity. Overall, our findings show that debiasing a model trained on biased toxic language data is not as effective as simply relabeling the data to remove existing biases.', 'ar': 'تمثل الارتباطات المتحيزة تحديًا في تطوير المصنفات للكشف عن اللغة السامة ، مما يعيق العدالة والدقة. كحلول محتملة ، نحقق في طرق إزالة الحواف التي تم تقديمها مؤخرًا لمجموعات بيانات ونماذج تصنيف النص ، كما هي مطبقة على اكتشاف اللغة السامة. ينصب تركيزنا على المعجم (على سبيل المثال ، الكلمات البذيئة ، والافتراءات ، وإشارات الهوية) وعلامات اللهجة (تحديدًا الإنجليزية الأمريكية الأفريقية). أثبتت تجاربنا الشاملة أن الأساليب الحالية محدودة في قدرتها على منع السلوك المتحيز في أجهزة الكشف عن السمية الحالية. ثم نقترح طريقة تلقائية لتصحيح البيانات مع مراعاة اللهجة ، كدليل على المفهوم. على الرغم من استخدام الملصقات الاصطناعية ، فإن هذه الطريقة تقلل من الارتباطات اللغوية بالسمية. بشكل عام ، تظهر النتائج التي توصلنا إليها أن إلغاء تحيز نموذج تم تدريبه على بيانات اللغة السامة المتحيزة ليس بنفس فعالية إعادة تسمية البيانات لإزالة التحيزات الموجودة.', 'es': 'Las asociaciones sesgadas han supuesto un desafío en el desarrollo de clasificadores para detectar el lenguaje tóxico, lo que dificulta la equidad y la precisión. Como posibles soluciones, investigamos métodos de desvío introducidos recientemente para conjuntos de datos y modelos de clasificación de texto, tal como se aplican a la detección de lenguaje tóxico. Nos centramos en el léxico (por ejemplo, malas palabras, insultos, menciones de identidad) y los marcadores dialectales (específicamente el inglés afroamericano). Nuestros exhaustivos experimentos establecen que los métodos existentes tienen una capacidad limitada para evitar el comportamiento sesgado en los detectores de toxicidad actuales. A continuación, proponemos un método de corrección de datos automático y sensible al dialecto, como prueba de concepto. A pesar del uso de etiquetas sintéticas, este método reduce las asociaciones dialectales con la toxicidad. En general, nuestros hallazgos muestran que debilitar un modelo entrenado en datos lingüísticos tóxicos sesgados no es tan efectivo como simplemente volver a etiquetar los datos para eliminar los sesgos existentes.', 'pt': 'Associações tendenciosas têm sido um desafio no desenvolvimento de classificadores para detectar linguagem tóxica, dificultando tanto a imparcialidade quanto a precisão. Como soluções potenciais, investigamos os métodos de despolarização introduzidos recentemente para conjuntos de dados e modelos de classificação de texto, aplicados à detecção de linguagem tóxica. Nosso foco é em marcadores lexicais (por exemplo, palavrões, insultos, menções de identidade) e dialetais (especificamente inglês afro-americano). Nossos experimentos abrangentes estabelecem que os métodos existentes são limitados em sua capacidade de evitar comportamento tendencioso nos atuais detectores de toxicidade. Em seguida, propomos um método de correção de dados automático, com reconhecimento de dialeto, como prova de conceito. Apesar do uso de rótulos sintéticos, esse método reduz as associações dialetais com toxicidade. No geral, nossas descobertas mostram que desvirtuar um modelo treinado em dados tendenciosos de linguagem tóxica não é tão eficaz quanto simplesmente rotular novamente os dados para remover vieses existentes.', 'fr': "Les associations biaisées ont constitué un défi dans le développement de classificateurs pour détecter le langage toxique, ce qui nuit à l'équité et à la précision. En tant que solutions potentielles, nous étudions les méthodes de dépolarisation récemment introduites pour les ensembles de données et les modèles de classification de texte, telles qu'appliquées à la détection de langage toxique. Nous nous concentrons sur les marqueurs lexicaux (par exemple, jurons, insultes, mentions d'identité) et dialectaux (en particulier l'anglais afro-américain). Nos expériences complètes montrent que les méthodes existantes sont limitées dans leur capacité à empêcher le comportement biaisé dans les détecteurs de toxicité actuels. Nous proposons ensuite une méthode de correction des données automatique et sensible au dialecte, comme preuve de concept. Malgré l'utilisation de marqueurs synthétiques, cette méthode réduit les associations dialectales avec la toxicité. Dans l'ensemble, nos résultats montrent que débiaiser un modèle formé sur des données biaisées de langage toxique n'est pas aussi efficace que de simplement réétiqueter les données pour éliminer les biais existants.", 'ja': '偏った関連付けは、有毒な言語を検出するための分類子の開発における課題であり、公平性と正確性の両方を妨げてきた。潜在的な解決策として、有毒言語検出に適用されたテキスト分類データセットとモデルのために最近導入されたデビアシング方法を調査します。私たちの焦点は、語彙的（例えば、誓いの言葉、罵倒、アイデンティティへの言及）と方言マーカー（特にアフリカ系アメリカ人の英語）です。当社の包括的な実験は、既存の方法が、現在の毒性検出器における偏った行動を防止する能力に制限されていることを確立しています。次に、概念の証明として、方言を意識した自動データ補正方法を提案します。合成標識を使用しているにもかかわらず、この方法は毒性との方言的関連を減少させる。全体的に、私たちの調査結果は、偏った有毒な言語データでトレーニングされたモデルをデビアシングすることは、既存の偏見を除去するために単にデータを再ラベル付けするほど効果的ではないことを示しています。', 'zh': '开以检毒言之类,偏见者一挑战,阻公平性准确性。 凡为潜解决方案,究近引文本分类数集及模形偏移法,宜于有毒语检测。 吾侪之重词汇(如脏话,诽谤及)方言(尤非裔美国人英语)。 吾等综实验表明,今法防时毒检测器偏倚有限。 然后,我们发出一种自己的,方言感知的数据校正方法,以为概验。 虽用合成签,减其毒方言。 总体而言,吾之治结果表明,有偏见者,有毒言数而倚之,非若易表而除偏见也。', 'ru': 'Предвзятые ассоциации являются проблемой при разработке классификаторов для обнаружения токсичных формулировок, что препятствует как справедливости, так и точности. В качестве потенциальных решений мы исследуем недавно введенные методы дебирования для наборов данных и моделей классификации текста, применяемые для обнаружения токсичных языков. Основное внимание мы уделяем лексическим (например, ругательствам, оскорблениям, упоминаниям об идентичности) и диалектным маркерам (в частности, афроамериканскому английскому). Наши комплексные эксперименты устанавливают, что существующие методы ограничены в своей способности предотвращать предвзятое поведение в текущих детекторах токсичности. Затем мы предлагаем автоматический метод коррекции данных, основанный на диалекте, в качестве доказательства концепции. Несмотря на использование синтетических меток, этот метод снижает диалектальные ассоциации с токсичностью. В целом, наши результаты показывают, что дебиризация модели, обученной на смещенных данных токсического языка, не так эффективна, как простое переименование данных для удаления существующих смещений.', 'hi': 'पक्षपातपूर्ण संघों विषाक्त भाषा का पता लगाने के लिए क्लासिफायरके विकास में एक चुनौती रही है, जो निष्पक्षता और सटीकता दोनों में बाधा डालती है। संभावित समाधान के रूप में, हम हाल ही में पाठ वर्गीकरण डेटासेट और मॉडल के लिए पेश किए गए debiasing तरीकों की जांच करते हैं, जैसा कि विषाक्त भाषा का पता लगाने के लिए लागू किया गया है। हमारा ध्यान लेक्सिकल (उदाहरण के लिए, कसम खाने वाले शब्द, slurs, पहचान का उल्लेख) और बोलचाल मार्करों (विशेष रूप से अफ्रीकी अमेरिकी अंग्रेजी) पर है। हमारे व्यापक प्रयोगों से स्थापित होता है कि मौजूदा तरीके वर्तमान विषाक्तता डिटेक्टरों में पक्षपाती व्यवहार को रोकने की उनकी क्षमता में सीमित हैं। फिर हम एक स्वचालित, बोली-जागरूक डेटा सुधार विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, एक सबूत-की-अवधारणा के रूप में। सिंथेटिक लेबल के उपयोग के बावजूद, यह विधि विषाक्तता के साथ बोली संघों को कम करती है। कुल मिलाकर, हमारे निष्कर्ष ों से पता चलता है कि पक्षपाती विषाक्त भाषा डेटा पर प्रशिक्षित मॉडल को डिबियास करना उतना प्रभावी नहीं है जितना कि मौजूदा पूर्वाग्रहों को दूर करने के लिए डेटा को फिर से लेबल करना।', 'ga': 'Ba dhúshlán é comhlachais claonta maidir le forbairt aicmitheoirí chun teanga thocsaineach a bhrath, rud a chuireann bac ar chothroime agus ar chruinneas araon. Mar réitigh fhéideartha, déanaimid imscrúdú ar mhodhanna díchlaonta a tugadh isteach le déanaí le haghaidh tacair sonraí agus samhlacha aicmithe téacs, mar a chuirtear i bhfeidhm iad ar bhrath teanga thocsaineach. Dírímid ar fhoclóireacht (m.sh. focail mhionnaithe, slurs, tagairtí céannachta) agus marcóirí canúinteacha (go háirithe Béarla Afraic-Mheiriceánach). Deimhníonn ár dturgnaimh chuimsitheacha go bhfuil na modhanna atá ann cheana féin teoranta ina gcumas chun iompar claonta i brathadóirí tocsaineachta reatha a chosc. Molaimid ansin modh ceartúcháin sonraí uathoibríoch, feasach ar chanúint, mar chruthúnas ar choincheap. In ainneoin úsáid a bhaint as lipéid shintéiseacha, laghdaíonn an modh seo comhlachais dialectacha le tocsaineacht. Ar an iomlán, léiríonn ár dtorthaí nach bhfuil sé chomh héifeachtach díchlaonadh a dhéanamh ar shamhail atá oilte ar shonraí teanga tocsaineacha claonta agus athlipéadú a dhéanamh ar na sonraí chun laofachtaí reatha a bhaint.', 'ka': 'უფრო დიდი აპორციაციები იყო კლასიფიკაციების განვითარებაში, რომელიც ტექსიკური ენის განვითარება, რომელიც მართლად და მართლად შეუძლებელია. როგორც პოტენციალური გახსნა, ჩვენ განვიყენებთ ახლა ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციის მონაცემების და მოდელებისთვის დებიზაციის მეტოვები, როგორც ტექსტიური ენის განვიყ ჩვენი ფონსკური არის ლექსიკალური (მაგალითად, სიტყვები, სიტყვები, სიტყვები, სიტყვები) და დიალექტური მარკერები (განსაკუთრებით აფრიკანული ანგლისურ ჩვენი ყველაფერი ექსპერიმენტები აღმოჩნენ, რომ მსგავსი მედისტები მათი შესაძლებლობაში გადაწყვეტილება მიმდინარე ტოქსიტების detectorებში. შემდეგ ჩვენ მოძლევით ავტომატური, დიალექტური მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის მეტი, როგორც კონფიგურაციის გამოწვება. სინტეტიკური ლაბეტების გამოყენებას მაგრამ, ეს პროცემი განსხვავებს დიალექტალური დაკავშირებების ტოქსიტებით. ჩვენი მონაცემები ჩვენი მონაცემები აჩვენებს, რომ მოდებიზება, რომელიც განაკეთებულია მოდებიზების მონაცემებისთვის მონაცემებისთვის, არ არის მხოლოდ ეფექტიური, რო', 'el': 'Οι προκατειλημμένες ενώσεις αποτέλεσαν πρόκληση στην ανάπτυξη ταξινομητών για την ανίχνευση τοξικής γλώσσας, εμποδίζοντας τόσο τη δικαιοσύνη όσο και την ακρίβεια. Ως πιθανές λύσεις, ερευνούμε πρόσφατα εισαγόμενες μεθόδους απομάκρυνσης για σύνολα δεδομένων και μοντέλα ταξινόμησης κειμένου, όπως εφαρμόζονται στην ανίχνευση τοξικών γλωσσών. Η εστίαση μας είναι στα λεξικά (π.χ. βρυκόλακες, συκοφαντίες, αναφορές ταυτότητας) και διαλεκτικά (συγκεκριμένα αφροαμερικανικά αγγλικά). Τα ολοκληρωμένα πειράματα μας αποδεικνύουν ότι οι υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι είναι περιορισμένες στην ικανότητά τους να αποτρέπουν προκατειλημμένη συμπεριφορά στους τρέχοντες ανιχνευτές τοξικότητας. Στη συνέχεια προτείνουμε μια αυτόματη μέθοδο διόρθωσης δεδομένων με βάση τη διάλεκτο, ως απόδειξη της έννοιας. Παρά τη χρήση συνθετικών ετικετών, η μέθοδος αυτή μειώνει τις διαλεκτικές συσχετίσεις με την τοξικότητα. Συνολικά, τα ευρήματά μας δείχνουν ότι η απομάκρυνση ενός μοντέλου εκπαιδευμένου σε προκατειλημμένα τοξικά δεδομένα γλώσσας δεν είναι τόσο αποτελεσματική όσο η απλή επανατοποθέτηση των δεδομένων για την εξάλειψη των υφιστάμενων προκαταλήψεων.', 'hu': 'A téves asszociációk kihívást jelentettek a mérgező nyelvek kimutatására szolgáló osztályozók fejlesztésében, ami akadályozta a méltányosságot és a pontosságot. Lehetséges megoldásként vizsgáljuk a szövegosztályozási adatkészletek és modellek nemrégiben bevezetett debiasing módszereit a toxikus nyelvek kimutatására. A hangsúlyt a lexikális (pl. esküszöm, káromkodás, identitás említések) és dialektális jelölők (különösen afro-amerikai angol). Átfogó kísérleteink megállapítják, hogy a már meglévő módszerek korlátozott képességük a jelenlegi toxicitási detektorok elfogult viselkedésének megakadályozására. Ezután egy automatikus, dialektus-tudatos adatkorrekciós módszert javasolunk, mint koncepcióbizonyítékot. A szintetikus címkék használata ellenére ez a módszer csökkenti a dialektális összefüggéseket a toxicitással. Összességében megállapításaink azt mutatják, hogy egy elfogult mérgező nyelvi adatokra képzett modell lebontása nem olyan hatékony, mint az adatok egyszerűen átcsoportosítása a meglévő elfogultságok eltávolítása érdekében.', 'it': "Le associazioni distorte sono state una sfida nello sviluppo di classificatori per la rilevazione del linguaggio tossico, ostacolando sia l'equità che l'accuratezza. Come potenziali soluzioni, studiamo metodi di debiasing recentemente introdotti per set di dati e modelli di classificazione del testo, come applicati alla rilevazione del linguaggio tossico. Il nostro focus è sui marcatori lessicali (ad esempio parolacce, insulti, citazioni di identità) e dialettali (in particolare l'inglese afro-americano). I nostri esperimenti completi stabiliscono che i metodi esistenti sono limitati nella loro capacità di prevenire comportamenti pregiudizievoli nei rivelatori di tossicità attuali. Proponiamo quindi un metodo automatico di correzione dei dati dialettale, come prova di concetto. Nonostante l'uso di etichette sintetiche, questo metodo riduce le associazioni dialettali con tossicità. Nel complesso, i nostri risultati mostrano che debiasing un modello addestrato su dati di linguaggio tossico pregiudizievole non è così efficace come semplicemente relabeling i dati per rimuovere pregiudizi esistenti.", 'mk': 'Обединетите здруженија претставуваат предизвик во развојот на класификаторите за детектирање токсичен јазик, попречувајќи ја и правдата и прецизноста. Како потенцијални решенија, ние неодамна ги истражуваме воведените методи на дебизација за податоци за класификација на текст и модели, како што се применуваат на детекција на токсичен јазик. Нашиот фокус се фокусира на лексикалните (на пример, зборовите на заклетвата, лурите, спомените за идентитетот) и дијалекталните маркери (посебно африкански американски англиски). Our comprehensive experiments establish that existing methods are limited in their ability to prevent biased behavior in current toxicity detectors.  Потоа предложуваме автоматски метод за корекција на податоците со свесност за дијалект, како доказ за концепт. И покрај употребата на синтетичките етикети, овој метод ги намалува дијалекталните асоцијации со токсичност. Вкупно, нашите откритија покажуваат дека дебизацијата на модел обучен на предрасудени токсични јазички податоци не е толку ефикасна како само повторно обележување на податоците за отстранување на постојните предрасуди.', 'kk': 'Қосымшалар дұрыс мен дұрыс тілді анықтау үшін классификациялық тілдерді жасау үшін көпшіліктерді жасау үшін көпшілік болды. Біз мүмкіндік шешімдер ретінде жаңа-ақ мәтін классификациялау деректер қорлары мен үлгілер үшін дебизациялау әдістерін зерттеп отырып, тәжірибе тілдерді анықта Біздің көздегеніміз лексикалық (мысалы, сөздер, күлкілер, идентификациялық мәліметтер) және диалекталық маркерлерге (әдетте Африкандық ағылшын тілінде). Біздің толық тәжірибеміздің барлық тәжірибелеріміз қазіргі токситлық анықтаушыларында тәжірибелерді шектеуге болады. Содан кейін біз автоматты, диалекттік түзету әдісін, концепциясы дұрыс ретінде қолданамыз. Синтетикалық жарлықтарды қолдануға қарамастан, бұл әдіс диалектикалық қатынастарды токсичілікті қысқартады. Барлық табылған мәліметтеріміз, барлық тәртіптерді өшіру үшін мәліметтерді өзгерту үшін, тәртіпсіздік тіл деректерінің дебияциялауын көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Sugalvotos asociacijos buvo iššūkis kuriant klasifikatorius toksiškai kalbai aptikti, trukdančius teisingumui ir tikslumui. Kaip galimi sprendimai, mes tiriame neseniai nustatytus tekstų klasifikavimo duomenų rinkinių ir modelių debisavimo metodus, taikomus toksiniam kalbų aptikimui. Mūsų dėmesys sutelkiamas į leksikalinius (pvz., prisiekiamuosius žodžius, slurs, tapatybės paminėjimus) ir dialektinius žymenis (ypač Afrikos Amerikos anglų kalbą). Mūsų išsamūs eksperimentai rodo, kad esami metodai yra riboti jų gebėjimu užkirsti kelią šoniniam elgesiui dabartiniuose toksiškumo detektoriuose. Tada siūlome automatinį, dialektiniu būdu žinomą duomenų koregavimo metodą, kaip koncepcijos įrodymą. Nepaisant sintetinių etikečių naudojimo, šiuo metodu mažinamos dialektinės sąsajos su toksiškumu. Apskritai, mūsų išvados rodo, kad neutralizuoti model į, mokomą remiantis sąžiningais toksiškos kalbos duomenimis, nėra toks veiksmingas kaip paprasčiausiai iš naujo pažymėti duomenis, kad būtų pašalinti esami sąžiningi aspektai.', 'ml': 'ക്ലാസിക്സിക്ക് ഭാഷ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനായി വിദ്യാഭാഷക്കാരുടെ പദ്ധതിയില്\u200d നിന്നും നീതിയും കൃത്യതയും തടഞ്ഞു സാധ്യതയുള്ള പരിഹാരങ്ങളായി നമ്മള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നത് അടുത്തുതന്നെ ടെക്സ്ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കേഷന്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200dക്കും മോഡലുകള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ശ്രദ്ധ പ്രശ്നം ലെക്സിക്കൽ (ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി വാക്കുകളിലേക്ക്, വാക്കുകളിലേക്ക്, തിരിച്ചറിയുന്ന പേരുകളില നമ്മുടെ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉറപ്പാക്കുന്നു നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ വ്യാപൃതമായ സ്വഭാവം തടഞ്ഞുനി പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d സ്വയം വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിപ്പിക്കുന്ന രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. സിന്തെറ്റിക് ലേബ്ലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന് ശേഷം, ഈ രീതിയില്\u200d വിദ്യാഭ്രാന്തിയോടൊപ്പം ഡയലക്ടിക്കല്\u200d സമ Overall, our findings show that debiasing a model trained on biased toxic language data is not as effective as simply relabeling the data to remove existing biases.', 'mt': 'L-assoċjazzjonijiet biased kienu sfida fl-iżvilupp ta’ klassifikaturi biex jinstabu lingwi tossiċi, li jfixklu kemm il-ġustizzja kif ukoll il-preċiżjoni. Bħala soluzzjonijiet potenzjali, qed ninvestigaw dan l-aħħar metodi ta’ debizzar introdotti għal settijiet ta’ dejta u mudelli ta’ klassifikazzjoni tat-test, kif applikati għall-individwazzjoni tossika tal-lingwi. L-enfasi tagħna hija fuq il-lexical (pereżempju kliem tal-ġurament, slurs, semmiet tal-identità) u markaturi dijalettiċi (speċifikament l-Ingliż Afrikan Amerikan). L-esperimenti komprensivi tagħna jistabbilixxu li l-metodi eżistenti huma limitati fil-kapaċità tagħhom li jipprevjenu mġiba preġudikata fid-detetturi attwali tat-tossiċità. Imbagħad nipproponu metodu awtomatiku ta’ korrezzjoni tad-dejta li jkun konxju mid-dijalekt, bħala prova tal-kunċett. Minkejja l-użu ta’ tikketti sintetiċi, dan il-metodu jnaqqas l-assoċjazzjonijiet dijalettiċi mat-tossiċità. B’mod ġenerali, is-sejbiet tagħna juru li d-debiżar ta’ mudell imħarreġ fuq dejta ta’ lingwa tossika preġudikata mhuwiex effettiv daqs sempliċement it-tikkettar mill-ġdid tad-dejta biex jitneħħew il-preġudizzji eżistenti.', 'ms': 'Biased associations have been a challenge in the development of classifiers for detecting toxic language, hindering both fairness and accuracy.  As potential solutions, we investigate recently introduced debiasing methods for text classification datasets and models, as applied to toxic language detection.  Fokus kita adalah pada leksikal (misalnya kata-kata sumpah, slurs, sebutan identiti) dan penanda dialektal (khususnya bahasa Inggeris Afrika Amerika). Eksperimen kompleks kami membuktikan bahawa kaedah yang wujud adalah terbatas dalam kemampuan mereka untuk mencegah perilaku bias dalam pengesan toksik semasa. Kemudian kami melaporkan kaedah pembetulan data secara automatik, yang sedar-dialekt, sebagai bukti-konsep. Walaupun menggunakan label sintetik, kaedah ini mengurangkan hubungan dialektal dengan toksik. Secara keseluruhan, penemuan kami menunjukkan bahawa debasing model yang dilatih pada data bahasa toksik bias tidak sama efektif seperti hanya menandakan semula data untuk menghapuskan biases yang wujud.', 'no': 'Utviklinga av klassifikatorar for å oppdaga toksisk språk, hindrar både rettighet og nøyaktighet. Som potensielle løsningar, er vi nyleg innført debiasingsmetoder for tekstklassifikasjonsdata og modeller som brukt til toksisk språk-oppdaging. Vårt fokus er på leksiske (f.eks. søver ord, slar, identitetsmerker) og dialektiske merker (spesielt afrikansk engelsk). Våre kompleksitte eksperimenter bestemmer at eksisterande metodar er begrenset i dei kanskje for å forebygge førehandsvising i gjeldande toksiktsdetektarar. Vi foreslår så ein automatisk datakorreksjonsmetode for dialekt-merke, som bevis-av-konsept. Til tross bruk av syntetiske merkelappar, denne metoden reduserer dialektiske tilknytingar med toksiskt. Finningane våre viser alltid at debiasing av eit modell trent på første toksiske språk-data er ikkje så effektivt som enkelt gjenoppretting av data for å fjerna eksisterande forsikt.', 'mn': 'Хүмүүсийн холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой байгууллагууд хохиромжтой хэл олж, шударга байдал болон зөв байдлыг зогсоохын тулд классификацийн хөгжлийн асуудал болсон. Тохиромжтой шийдлийн хувьд бид саяхан текст хуваалтын өгөгдлийн санг, загваруудыг судалж, хортой хэлний шийдвэрлэлд хэрэглэгдсэн. Бидний анхаарлын төвлөрөмж нь лексик (жишээ нь, үг, шүлэг, нэр тодорхойлолт) болон диалектик маркертүүд (ялангуяа Африкийн Англи хэлний хэлний хэлний хэлний тухай). Бидний бүтэн туршилтууд орчин үеийн хохиромжтой тогтоогчдын давхар үйл явдлыг зогсоох боломжтой байдалд хязгаарлагддаг. Дараа нь бид автоматик, диалектик мэдэх өгөгдлийн зөв загвар, ойлголтын баталгаа гэж санал өгдөг. Синтетик загваруудыг хэрэглэхээсээ ч энэ арга нь хохиромжтой диалектикийн холбоотой багасгаж байна. Бидний олж мэдсэн зүйлс нь тодорхойлолтой хохиромжтой хэл өгөгдлийн талаар сургалтын загварын загварын загварын загварын загварын загварын загварын загварын загварын загварын загварын загварын талаар нь', 'ro': 'Asociațiile defavorizate au reprezentat o provocare în dezvoltarea de clasificatori pentru detectarea limbajului toxic, împiedicând atât echitatea, cât și acuratețea. Ca soluții potențiale, investigăm recent metode de debiasing introduse pentru seturi de date și modele de clasificare a textelor, aplicate detectării limbajului toxic. Ne concentrăm pe markerii lexicali (de exemplu, cuvinte de jurământ, insulte, mențiuni de identitate) și dialectali (în special engleză afro-americană). Experimentele noastre cuprinzătoare stabilesc că metodele existente sunt limitate în capacitatea lor de a preveni comportamentul părtinitor în detectoarele de toxicitate actuale. Apoi propunem o metodă automată de corecție a datelor, conștientă de dialect, ca dovadă de concept. În ciuda utilizării etichetelor sintetice, această metodă reduce asocierile dialectale cu toxicitatea. În general, constatările noastre arată că dezafectarea unui model instruit pe date de limbaj toxic părtinitor nu este la fel de eficientă ca simpla relaxare a datelor pentru a elimina părtinitoarele existente.', 'pl': 'Stronnicze skojarzenia stanowią wyzwanie w opracowywaniu klasyfikatorów do wykrywania toksycznego języka, utrudniając zarówno sprawiedliwość, jak i dokładność. Jako potencjalne rozwiązania badamy wprowadzone niedawno metody debiacingu dla zestawów danych klasyfikacji tekstu i modeli, stosowane do wykrywania toksycznego języka. Skupiamy się na znacznikach leksykalnych (np. przekleństwa, obrzydzenia, wzmianki tożsamości) i dialektalnych (w szczególności angielski afroamerykański). Nasze kompleksowe eksperymenty ustalają, że istniejące metody są ograniczone w ich zdolności do zapobiegania stronniczemu zachowaniu w obecnych detektorach toksyczności. Następnie proponujemy automatyczną, dialektową metodę korekty danych, jako proof-of-concept. Pomimo zastosowania etykiet syntetycznych metoda ta zmniejsza dialektalne skojarzenia z toksycznością. Ogólnie rzecz biorąc, nasze ustalenia pokazują, że odbiór modelu przeszkolonego na podstawie stronniczych danych toksycznych językowych nie jest tak skuteczny jak po prostu przekształcanie danych w celu usunięcia istniejących uprzedzeń.', 'sr': 'Izazov u razvoju klasifikatora za otkrivanje toksičnog jezika i sprječavanje pravde i tačnosti. Kao potencijalna rešenja, istražujemo nedavno uvođene metode debijacije za sete podataka i modele klasifikacije teksta, primjenjene na otkrivanje toksičnog jezika. Naš fokus je na leksičkim (npr. zakletve rijeèi, slure, spominjanja identiteta) i dijalektskim markerima (posebno afrički američki engleski). Naši sveobuhvatni eksperimenti utvrđuju da postojeće metode ograničene u njihovoj sposobnosti da spriječi predrasudeno ponašanje u trenutnim detektorima toksičnosti. Onda predlažemo automatsku, dijalektnu metodu isprave podataka, kao dokaz koncepta. Uprkos upotrebi sintetičkih etiketa, ova metoda smanjuje dijalektne povezanosti sa toksičnošću. Naši nalazi pokazuju da debijacija model a obučenog na predrasudenim toksičnim jezičkim podacima nije toliko efikasna kao jednostavno ponovno uklanjanje podataka da uklonimo postojeće predrasude.', 'so': 'Ururada lagu isticmaalay waa dhibaato horumarinta dadka fasaxa ah oo la ogaanayo luqada maandooriyaha, oo ka hor jeediya caddaaladda iyo saxda. Sida xalalka suurtagalka ah, waxaynu ugu dhowaan baaraynaa qaabab khatar ah oo loo soo bandhigay qoraal-tababarida iyo tusaalooyin, sida loo codsaday baaritaanka luuqada toksiska ah. Xujadayadu wuxuu ku qoran yahay mukhaadaraadka (tusaale ahaan hadallada, naafadaha, magaca aqoonsiga) iyo calaamadaha caadiga ah (khusuusan afka Afrika oo ingiriisiya). Imtixaanka aasaasiga ah waxay xaqiijiyaan in qaababka joogta ay ku xadanyihiin awoodooda ay ka hor istaagaan dabeecada caqliga dhimirka. Markaas waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab saxda macluumaadka oo si automatic ah oo loo yaqaan, sida caddeynta fikrada. Inta kastoo ay isticmaali karto alaabta synthetika, qaababkan waxay hoos u dhigtaa ururada dhibaatada la xiriira dhibaatada. Overall, our findings show that debiasing a model trained on biased toxic language data is not as effective as simply relabeling the data to remove existing biases.', 'si': 'විශ්වාසික භාෂාව හොයාගන්න විශ්වාස කරපු අභ්\u200dයාසයක් තියෙනවා, සාමාන්\u200dයතාවය සහ හරියට අවධානය කරන්න. ප්\u200dරතිශ්න විශ්වාස වලින්, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ අවස්ථානයෙන් විශ්වාස කරන්නේ පාළුවේ විශේෂණ දත්ත සෙට් සහ අපේ අවධානය ලෙක්සිකල් වචන, ස්ලෝර්, අනතුරු කිරීමක් සහ ඩායිලෙක්ටල් මාර්කර් (විශේෂයෙන්ම අෆ්\u200dරිකානික් ඇ අපේ සම්පූර්ණ පරීක්ෂණය ස්ථාපිත විදිහට තියෙන්නේ ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහ අපි පස්සේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය, ඩායිලෙක්ට් අනතුරු දත්ත ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, සාක්ෂි සින්ටෙටික් ලේබල් භාවිතා කරලා තියෙන්නේ නැත්නම්, මේ විදියට ඩායිලක්ටික් සම්බන්ධතාවක් විශේෂ සම්පූර්ණයෙන්, අපේ හොයාගන්න පෙන්වන්නේ විශ්වාසික භාෂා දත්තේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරලා තියෙන්නේ නැති විශ්වාසික වි', 'ur': 'بہت زیادہ مشترکیوں نے جسمی زبان کا اظہار کرنے کے لئے کلاسیفوں کی تخلیق میں ایک چال کیا ہے، انصاف اور دقیق کو روکتے ہیں۔ امکانات حل کے طور پر، ہم نے اچھے وقت تک ٹیکسٹ کلاسپیٹ ڈیٹ سٹ اور موڈل کے لئے ڈبیسینگ طریقے معلوم کیے، جیسے سمیٹ زبان شناسایی کے لئے استعمال کیے جاتے ہیں. ہمارا تدبیر لکسیکل پر ہے۔ ہمارے تمام تجربے ثابت ہوتے ہیں کہ موجود طریقے ان کی قابلیت میں محدود ہیں کہ موجود toxicity detectors کے ذریعہ منع کریں. اس کے بعد ہم ایک دکھانے والی دکھانے والی دکھانے والی دکھانے والی دکھانے والی طریقہ کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں۔ سنٹیٹیک لیبل کے استعمال کے بغیر، یہ طریقہ جسم کے دیالکتل تعلقات کو کم کر دیتا ہے. ہمارے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایک موڈل کی تعلیم دی جاتی ہے جسمی زبان ڈاٹی پر جو موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجو', 'sv': 'Biased association har varit en utmaning i utvecklingen av klassificerare för att upptäcka giftigt språk, vilket hindrar både rättvisa och noggrannhet. Som potentiella lösningar undersöker vi nyligen introducerade debiasing metoder för textklassificering datauppsättningar och modeller, som tillämpas vid toxisk språkdetektion. Vårt fokus ligger på lexikala (t.ex. svärord, slurs, identitetsuppgifter) och dialektiska markörer (specifikt afroamerikansk engelska). Våra omfattande experiment visar att befintliga metoder är begränsade i sin förmåga att förhindra partiskt beteende i nuvarande toxicitetsdetektorer. Vi föreslår sedan en automatisk, dialektmedveten datakorrigeringsmetod, som ett proof-of-concept. Trots användningen av syntetiska etiketter minskar denna metod dialektiska associationer med toxicitet. Sammantaget visar våra resultat att nedvärdera en modell utbildad på partisk toxisk språkdata inte är lika effektivt som att helt enkelt omfördela data för att ta bort befintliga fördomar.', 'ta': 'பைஸ்ட் கூட்டத்துக்கள் புதிய மொழியை கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான வகுப்பாளர்களை உருவாக்கும் சவால் சாத்தியமான தீர்வுகளாக இருந்தால், நாம் சமீபத்தில் உரை வகைப்படுத்தல் தரவுகள் மற்றும் மாதிரிகளுக்கு பிழையான முறைகளை ஆராய்ச்ச நம்முடைய கவனத்தின் மீது (உதாரணமாக, வார்த்தைகள், புலங்கள், அடையாளம் குறிப்புகள்) மற்றும் குறிப்பிட்ட குறிகள் (குறிப்பிட எங்கள் சூழ்நிலை சோதனைகள் நிறைவேற்றுகிறது நடப்பு புவியியல் கண்டுபிடிப்பவர்களில் இருக்கும் முறைகள் எல்லாம் உள்ளன என் பின்னர் நாம் ஒரு தானியக்கமாக, தெரியும் தகவல் திருத்தம் முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். தொடர்புடைய சிட்டைகளை பயன்படுத்த வேண்டுமானாலும், இந்த முறையில் தொடர்புடன் தொடர்புகளை குறைக்கிறது. மொத்தமாக, எங்கள் கண்டுபிடிப்புகள் காட்டுகிறது நடப்பு பிரச்சினைகளை நீக்க ஒரு மாதிரி பயிற்சியில் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட மாதிரி', 'uz': "Koʻrsatilgan tashkilotlar tizim tilni aniqlash uchun muammolar bo'lgan, haqiqat va tashkilotni kuzatishga harakat qiladi. Muhimlik usullar sifatida, biz yaqinda matn classification maʼlumotlari va modellari uchun bajarish usullarini o'rganamiz, toksisk tilni aniqlash uchun qoʻllanmiz. Bizning fokusiz leksikal (масалан so'zlar, suhbatlar, shaxsiyatlar) va dialektal markiyatlar (oddiy Afrika Inglizcha). Bizning umumiy imtiyozlarimiz esa, mavjud usullar joriy toksistik detektorlarida harakat qilish qobiliyatlariga chegara bo'ladi. Keyin biz avtomatik, dialektik va haqiqiqiy maʼlumot toʻgʻri usulini tasavvur qilamiz. @ info: whatsthis Umumiy, bizning murojaatlarimiz hozir esa, bizning taʼminlovchi tizim haqida o'rnatilgan modelni bajarish imkoniyatini ko'rsatadi. Maʼlumotlar maʼlumotni qaytadan olib tashlashni saqlash juda foydalanishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Suy nghĩ viên chức là một thử thách trong việc phát hiện ngôn ngữ độc hại, gây cản trở sự công bằng và độ chính xác. Với tư cách là những giải pháp tiềm năng, chúng tôi nghiên cứu các phương pháp thao túng lỗi thời cho các tập tin và mẫu phân loại văn bản, được áp dụng cho việc phát hiện ngôn ngữ độc. Chúng tôi tập trung vào ngôn ngữ (ví dụ, chửi thề, nói xấu, danh tính, chỉ điểm) và các dấu hiệu địa phương (đặc biệt tiếng Anh Mỹ g ốc Phi). Các thí nghiệm to àn diện của chúng tôi xác định rằng các phương pháp tồn tại hạn chế trong khả năng ngăn chặn hành vi thiên vị trong các máy phát hiện độc tính hiện nay. Chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp sửa chữa dữ liệu tự động, dựa trên phương thức. Mặc dù dùng các nhãn tổng hợp, phương pháp này làm giảm các liên quan địa phương với độc tính. Tóm lại, những nghiên cứu của chúng tôi cho thấy làm giả một mô hình được huấn luyện dựa trên các dữ liệu ngôn ngữ độc hại không hiệu quả bằng việc nới lỏng dữ liệu để xóa bỏ các tật xấu.', 'nl': 'Vooringenomen associaties zijn een uitdaging geweest bij de ontwikkeling van classificatoren voor het opsporen van toxische taal, die zowel eerlijkheid als nauwkeurigheid belemmeren. Als mogelijke oplossingen onderzoeken we recent geïntroduceerde debiasing methoden voor tekstclassificatie datasets en modellen, zoals toegepast op toxische taaldetectie. Onze focus ligt op lexicale (bijv. vloekwoorden, lasters, identiteitsvermeldingen) en dialectische markers (specifiek Afro-Amerikaans Engels). Onze uitgebreide experimenten stellen vast dat bestaande methoden beperkt zijn in hun vermogen om biased gedrag in huidige toxiciteitsdetectoren te voorkomen. Vervolgens stellen we een automatische, dialectbewuste gegevenscorrectiemethode voor, als proof-of-concept. Ondanks het gebruik van synthetische labels vermindert deze methode dialectische associaties met toxiciteit. Over het algemeen tonen onze bevindingen aan dat het debiasen van een model dat is getraind op biased toxisch taalgegevens niet zo effectief is als het herverdelen van de gegevens om bestaande biases te verwijderen.', 'bg': 'Предубедените асоциации са предизвикателство в разработването на класификатори за откриване на токсичен език, възпрепятстващи както справедливостта, така и точността. Като потенциални решения изследваме въведените наскоро методи за класификация на текста набори от данни и модели, прилагани при откриване на токсични езици. Фокусът ни е върху лексикалните (напр. псувни, клевети, споменаване на идентичността) и диалекталните маркери (по-специално афроамерикански английски). Нашите изчерпателни експерименти установяват, че съществуващите методи са ограничени в способността си да предотвратяват пристрастно поведение в настоящите детектори за токсичност. След това ние предлагаме автоматичен метод за корекция на данните, съобразен с диалекта, като доказателство за концепцията. Въпреки използването на синтетични етикети, този метод намалява диалекталните асоциации с токсичността. Като цяло, нашите констатации показват, че дебиализирането на модел, обучен върху предубедени данни за токсични езици, не е толкова ефективно, колкото просто повторното добавяне на данните за премахване на съществуващите предразсъдъци.', 'da': 'Forvekslede sammenslutninger har været en udfordring i udviklingen af klassificerere til påvisning af giftigt sprog, hvilket har hindret både retfærdighed og nøjagtighed. Som potentielle løsninger undersøger vi nyligt indførte debiasing metoder til tekstklassifikationsdatasæt og modeller, som anvendes til detektion af giftige sprog. Vores fokus er på lexikale (f.eks. sværgeord, slurs, identitetsnævnelser) og dialektiske markører (specifikt afroamerikansk engelsk). Vores omfattende eksperimenter fastslår, at eksisterende metoder er begrænset i deres evne til at forhindre partisk adfærd i nuværende toksicitetsdetektorer. Vi foreslår derefter en automatisk, dialektbevidst datakorrektionsmetode, som et proof-of-concept. På trods af brugen af syntetiske etiketter reducerer denne metode dialektiske forbindelser med toksicitet. Samlet set viser vores resultater, at det ikke er så effektivt at nedbryde en model, der er trænet i partiske toksiske sprogdata, som blot at relabele data for at fjerne eksisterende partiske sprogdata.', 'hr': 'Većin a udruženja bila je izazov u razvoju klasifikatora za otkrivanje toksičnog jezika i sprječavanje pravednosti i preciznosti. Kao moguće rješenja, istražujemo nedavno uvođene metode debijacije za setove podataka i modele klasifikacije teksta, primjenjene na otkrivanje toksičnog jezika. Naš fokus je na leksičkim (npr. riječima zakletvom, slušama, spominjanjem identiteta) i dijalektskim označavačima (posebno afričkog američkog engleskog). Naši sveobuhvatni eksperimenti utvrđuju da postojeće metode ograničene u njihovoj sposobnosti spriječiti pristrasno ponašanje u trenutnim detektorima toksičnosti. Zatim predlažemo automatsku, dijalektnu metodu isprave podataka kao dokaz koncepta. Unatoč uporabi sintetičkih etiketa, ta metoda smanjuje dijalektne povezanosti s toksičnošću. Nakon svega, naši nalazi pokazuju da debijacija model a obučenog na podacima predrasudenih toksičnih jezika nije toliko učinkovita kao jednostavno ponovno uklanjanje podataka za uklanjanje postojećih predrasuda.', 'de': 'Voreingenommene Assoziationen waren eine Herausforderung bei der Entwicklung von Klassifikatoren zur Erkennung toxischer Sprache und behindern sowohl Fairness als auch Genauigkeit. Als mögliche Lösungen untersuchen wir kürzlich eingeführte Debiasing-Methoden für Textklassifikationsdatensätze und -modelle, wie sie auf die Erkennung toxischer Sprache angewendet werden. Unser Fokus liegt auf lexikalischen (z.B. Schimpfwörter, Beleidigungen, Identitätserwähnungen) und dialektalen Markern (speziell Afroamerikanisches Englisch). Unsere umfangreichen Experimente zeigen, dass vorhandene Methoden in ihrer Fähigkeit zur Vermeidung von Verzerrungen in aktuellen Toxizitätsdetektoren begrenzt sind. Als Proof-of-Concept schlagen wir dann eine automatische, dialektbewusste Datenkorrektur vor. Trotz der Verwendung synthetischer Etiketten reduziert diese Methode dialektale Assoziationen mit Toxizität. Insgesamt zeigen unsere Ergebnisse, dass das Entbiasen eines Modells, das auf voreingenommenen toxischen Sprachdaten trainiert wurde, nicht so effektiv ist, wie das bloße Neubelieren der Daten, um bestehende Verzerrungen zu beseitigen.', 'ko': '유독언어를 검출하는 양사를 개발할 때 편견이 있는 연상은 공평성과 정확성을 저해하는 도전이었다.잠재적인 해결 방안으로 우리는 최근에 도입된 텍스트 분류 데이터 집합과 모델에 사용되는debiasing 방법을 연구하여 유독 언어 검측에 응용하였다.우리의 중점은 어휘(예를 들어 욕, 욕, 신분 언급)와 사투리 표기(특히 아프리카계 미국 영어)이다.우리의 종합적인 실험은 기존의 방법이 현재 독성 검출기에서의 편차 행위를 방지하는 데 한계가 있다는 것을 보여 준다.그리고 우리는 자동적이고 사투리 감지의 데이터 교정 방법을 제시하여 개념적 증명으로 삼았다.합성 라벨을 사용했음에도 불구하고 이런 방법은 사투리와 독성의 연관성을 감소시켰다.전반적으로 말하자면 우리의 연구 결과에 따르면 편견이 있는 유독언어 데이터 훈련을 바탕으로 하는 모델에 대해 탈지를 하는 것은 기존의 편견을 없애는 것처럼 간단하게 데이터를 다시 표시하는 것이 효과적이지 않다고 한다.', 'id': 'Assosisi yang biased telah menjadi tantangan dalam pembangunan klasifikasi untuk mendeteksi bahasa beracun, menghalangi keadilan dan akurasi. Sebagai solusi potensial, kami menyelidiki baru-baru ini memperkenalkan metode debiasing untuk set data klasifikasi teks dan model, seperti yang diterapkan untuk deteksi bahasa beracun. Fokus kami adalah pada lexik (contohnya kata-kata sumpah, slurs, sebutan identitas) dan marker dialektal (khusus bahasa Inggris Afrika Amerika). Eksperimen komprensif kami membuktikan bahwa metode yang ada terbatas dalam kemampuan mereka untuk mencegah perilaku bias dalam detektor toksicitas saat ini. Kemudian kami mengusulkan metode koreksi data otomatis, yang menyadari dialekt, sebagai bukti konsep. Meskipun menggunakan label sintetis, metode ini mengurangi asosiasi dialektal dengan toksicitas. Secara umum, penemuan kami menunjukkan bahwa debiasing model yang dilatih pada data bahasa racun bias tidak sama efektif seperti merebel ulang data untuk menghapus bias yang ada.', 'fa': 'اتحادیه\u200cهای زیادی در توسعه\u200cهای مختصات برای شناسایی زبان سمی چالش بوده\u200cاند، مانع عدالت و دقیقیت. به عنوان راه حل\u200cهای پتانسیل، اخیراً روش\u200cهایی که برای مجموعه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cبندی داده\u200cهای متن و مدل\u200cهایی برای شناسایی زبانهای سمی معرفی می\u200cکنیم، تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. تمرکز ما روی لیکسیکی است (به عنوان کلمات سوگند خوردن، سوگند خوردن، هویت یادآوری) و نشانه\u200cهای دیالکتی (به عنوان انگلیسی آمریکایی آفریقایی). آزمایشات کامل ما ثابت می\u200cکنند که روش\u200cهای موجود در توانایی\u200cهایشان محدود هستند تا جلوگیری از رفتارهای مخالفت در بازرسان سمی\u200cهای فعلی باشند. سپس ما یک روش اصلاح داده\u200cهای خودکار و دیال\u200cلکت را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، به عنوان مدرک\u200cهای مفهوم. با وجود استفاده از برچسب\u200cهای سینتیک، این روش ارتباطات دیالکتی با سمی را کاهش می\u200cکند. در کل، نتیجه\u200cهایمان نشان می\u200cدهند که درباره\u200cی داده\u200cهای زبان سمی آموزش یافته شده\u200cاند، به اندازه\u200cی ساده\u200cای که اطلاعات را برای حذف کردن طبقه\u200cهای موجود تغییر داده\u200cاند، موثر نیست.', 'sw': 'Mashirika yaliyotengwa yamekuwa changamoto katika maendeleo ya wachapaji kwa kutambua lugha ya kisaikolojia, yanazuia usawa na ukweli. Kama ufumbuzi wa uwezekano, hivi karibuni tunachunguza mbinu za mabaya kwa ajili ya seti za taarifa za usambazaji wa maandishi na mifano, kama ilivyotumiwa kwa kutambua lugha yenye sumu. Lengo letu lina msisitizo (kama vile maneno, lugha, taja za utambulisho) na alama za kiutambulisho (hasa ya Kiafrika wa Kiingereza). Majaribio yetu ya msingi yanathibitisha kuwa mbinu zilizopo zimepungua uwezo wa kuzuia tabia za kibaguzi katika wachunguzi wa vibaya vya sasa. Kisha tunapendekeza njia ya kurekebisha taarifa za kujitegemea, kama ushahidi wa dhana. Pamoja na matumizi ya mabango ya pamoja, mbinu hii inapunguza mashirika ya kizungumzo na ukosoaji. Kwa ujumla, matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kuwa kuharibu muundo wa kufundishwa kwa taarifa za lugha za kisaikolojia hazina ufanisi kama tu unavyovuta taarifa za kuondoa upendeleo uliopo.', 'tr': 'Toksik dilini tanyşdyrmak üçin, ikisi derejeli we dogruçylygy çykarmak üçin klasifikalaryň gelişmesinde kynçylyk bar. Mümkin çözümler ýaly, toksik diller deteksiyona uygulanan metin klasifikasy datawatlary we nusgalary üçin edilen debiasing yöntemleri çykarypdyk. Biziň fokusymyz (meseläm, sözlerimiz, slurlerimiz, diýetleşmelerimiz) we dialektal işaretçilerimiz (özellikle Afrika Amerika dilinde). Biziň bütin deneymiz şu wagt toksiýet detektirlerinde gurnalan yöntemleriň edil edil bar yöntemleri ukyplarynda çykaryp bardygyny tassyklaýar. Sonra, biz otomatik, dialekte-bilinç maglumaty düzeltmek yöntemi, concept-of-proof olarak teklip edip görýäris. Sintetik etiketler ulanmasa bile, bu yöntem dialektal baglaýyşlary toksik bilen azaltýar. Iň pikirimçe, biziň tapylyklarymyz şu ýerde bolan sowgatly dil maglumatyna öwrenmek üçin bir nusga çykmak üçin meňzeş durmuşlary ýene-de täsirli däldir.', 'sq': 'Shoqatat e mërzitura kanë qenë një sfidë në zhvillimin e klasifikuesve për zbulimin e gjuhës toksike, duke penguar si drejtësinë ashtu edhe saktësinë. Si zgjidhje të mundshme, ne hetojmë kohët e fundit futën metoda debizimi për grupet e të dhënave dhe modelet e klasifikimit të tekstit, siç aplikohen për zbulimin toksik të gjuhës. Our focus is on lexical (e.g., swear words, slurs, identity mentions) and dialectal markers (specifically African American English).  Eksperimentet tona të përgjithshme vendosin se metodat ekzistuese janë të kufizuara në aftësinë e tyre për të parandaluar sjelljen e paragjykuar në detektorët aktual të toksicitetit. Pastaj propozojmë një metodë automatike të korrektimit të të dhënave me dijeni të dialektit, si prova e konceptit. Megjithë përdorimin e etiketave sintetike, ky metodë redukton shoqatat dialektale me toksicitet. Në përgjithësi, gjetjet tona tregojnë se dobësimi i një modeli të trajnuar në të dhënat e paragjykimit toksik të gjuhës nuk është aq i efektshëm sa thjesht rilibrimi i të dhënave për të hequr paragjykimet ekzistuese.', 'af': "Verklein toesamenskappe is 'n uitdaging in die ontwikkeling van klassifiseerders vir toksiske taal te ontdek, wat beide regverdigheid en presisiteit hinder. As potensiele oplossings, ondersoek ons onlangs die debiasing metodes vir teks klassifikasie datastelle en modele, soos gebruik word na toksiese taal opdekking. Ons fokus is op leksies (bv. sweer woorde, slaars, identiteit bepaal) en dialektiese merkers (spesifieke Afrikaanse Amerikaanse Engels). Ons komprehensiewe eksperimente stel dat bestaande metodes in hul moontlikheid beperk is om voorspoedige gedrag te voorkom in huidige toksisiteit-detektors. Ons voorstel dan 'n outomatiese, dialekte-bevestig data korreksie metode, as 'n bevestig-van-konsept. Onthou die gebruik van sintetiese etikette, verduur hierdie metode dialektiese assosiasies met toksiteit. Oorsaaklik, ons gevinde vertoon dat die debiasing van 'n model wat op gewone toksike taal data gegee is, nie so effektief as eenvoudig om die data te herbeskikbaar om bestaande biasies te verwyder nie.", 'am': 'የፍላጎች ማኅበረሰቦች ትክክለኛ ቋንቋዎችን ለማግኘት፣ ፍርድን እና እርግጠኛ ማግኘት የሚከለክሉ ናቸው፡፡ የቻይነት መፍትሄዎች፣ በቅርብ ጊዜ ለጽሑፍ መግለጫ ዳታዎችን እና ሞዴላዎችን ለማግኘት እና የስክሲ ቋንቋ ማግኘት እንደተጠቃሚ እና እናሳውቃለን፡፡ አካባቢነታችን የልስክሲካዊ (ምሳሌ ቃላት፣ ውጤቶች፣ የidentity ማወቂያ) እና አፍሪካዊ እንግሊዘኛ (በተለየ አፍሪካ እንግሊዘኛ) የውጤት ፈተናዎቻችን የአሁኑን ሥርዓት በሁኔታ የስክስቲ አካባቢዎችን ለመከላከል የሚችሉትን ሥርዓት መሆኑን የሚያረጋግጡ ናቸው፡፡ በኋላም አካባቢ እናውቀው የነበረውን የዳታ አስተካክል ሥርዓት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በሲንቲካዊ ምልክቶች በተጠቀም እንኳ፣ ይህ method ዳሌካዊ ማኅበረሰቦችን በጥቁር ያጎድላል፡፡ በጠቅላላ፣ የድምፅ ቋንቋ ዳታዎችን የተጠቃሚ ሞዴል የሚያሳየው ዳራዎችን ለማስወግድ የሚቻል አይደለም፡፡', 'hy': 'Սովորաբար սոցիալացված կազմակերպությունները մարտահրավեր են եղել թունավոր լեզուների հայտնաբերման դասակարգիչների զարգացման մեջ, որոնք խոչընդոտում են արդարությունը և ճշգրտությունը: Որպես պոտենցիալ լուծումներ, մենք հետազոտում ենք վերջերս ներկայացված թեքստի դասակարգման տվյալների համակարգերի և մոդելների ձախողման մեթոդները, ինչպես կիրառվում է թունավոր լեզուների հայտնաբերման համար: Our focus is on lexical (e.g., swear words, slurs, identity mentions) and dialectal markers (specifically African American English).  Մեր ընդհանուր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդները սահմանափակված են իրենց կարողության կանխել կողմնակի վարքագիծը ներկայիս թունավոր դետեկտորների մեջ: Այնուհետև մենք առաջարկում ենք ավտոմատիկ, դիալեկտ գիտակցած տվյալների ուղղելու մեթոդ, որպես հասկացության ապացույց: Չնայած սինթետիկ պիտակների օգտագործման, այս մեթոդը նվազեցնում է դիալեկտալ կապերը թունավորության հետ: Ընդհանուր առմամբ, մեր հայտնաբերությունները ցույց են տալիս, որ կողմնակի թունավոր լեզվի տվյալների վրա սովորեցված մոդելի թույլատրելը այնքան արդյունավետ չէ, որքան պարզապես վերաբեռնել տվյալները գոյություն ունեցող', 'az': 'Böyük şəriklər zehirli dili keşfetmək üçün, ədaləti və doğruluğu öndərmək üçün klasifikatçıların təhsil edilməsində bir çətinlikdir. Mümkün çətinliklər olaraq, yenidən mətn klasifikasyonu verilən qurğular və modellər üçün debiasing metodlarını təşkil edirik, zehirli dil keşfetməsinə uyğun kimi. Bizim təsirimiz leksik (məsələn, yemin sözləri, cürbəcür, kimlik sözləri) və dialektal işaretçiləridir. Bizim tükənməz təcrübələrimiz, həmin metodların hökmən toxicit detektörlərində təhlükəsizlik davranışlarını qadağan etməyə qadir olduğunu təsdiqləyir. Sonra özünüzə təsdiqləyici, dialekti bilən verilər düzəltmə metodu təbliğ edirik. Sintetik etiketlərin istifadəsinə baxmayaraq, bu metod dəyişiklik bağlantılarını azaldır. Əlbəttə, bizim tapındıqlarımız göstərir ki, təsirli dil məlumatlarında təhsil edilmiş modeli təhsil etmək, mevcut təsirləri silmək üçün məlumatları yenidən təhsil etmək qədər faydalı deyildir.', 'bs': 'Većin a udruženja bila je izazov u razvoju klasifikatora za otkrivanje toksičnog jezika i sprječavanje pravednosti i tačnosti. Kao potencijalne rješenja, istražujemo nedavno uvođene metode debijacije za sete podataka i modele klasifikacije teksta, primjenjene na otkrivanje toksičnog jezika. Naš fokus je na leksičkim (npr. riječima zakletvom, slušama, spominjanjem identiteta) i dijalektskim markerima (posebno afričkog američkog engleskog). Naši sveobuhvatni eksperimenti utvrđuju da postojeće metode ograničene u njihovoj sposobnosti spriječiti pristrasno ponašanje u trenutnim detektorima toksičnosti. Onda predlažemo automatsku, dijalektnu metodu isprave podataka kao dokaz koncepta. Uprkos uporabi sintetičkih etiketa, ova metoda smanjuje dijalektne povezanosti sa toksičnošću. Naši nalazi pokazuju da debijacija model a obučenog na predrasudenim toksičnim jezičkim podacima nije toliko efikasna kao jednostavno ponovno uklanjanje podataka za uklanjanje postojećih predrasuda.', 'ca': "Les associacions malucades han estat un repte en el desenvolupament de classificadors per detectar llenguatges tòxics, dificultant la justesa i la precisió. Com solucions potencials, investigam mètodes de debització introduïts recentment per a conjunts de dades i models de classificació de textos, aplicats a la detecció tòxica de llenguatges. La nostra atenció es centra en els marcadors lèxics (per exemple, paraules juradores, frases, mentions d'identitat) i dialectals (específicament anglès afroamericans). Els nostres experiments complets establezen que els mètodes existents són limitats en la seva habilitat de prevenir comportaments bias en detectors de toxicitat actuals. Llavors proposem un mètode de correcció automàtica i conscient del dialecte de dades, com prova del concepte. Malgrat l'ús d'etiquetes sintètiques, aquest mètode redueix les associacions dialectals amb toxicitat. En general, els nostres descobriments mostren que debilitar un model entrenat en dades de llenguatges tòxics bias no és tan efectiu com simplement rebaixar les dades per eliminar biases existents.", 'cs': 'Při vývoji klasifikátorů pro detekci toxického jazyka představují zaujaté asociace výzvu zaujaté asociace, které brání spravedlnosti i přesnosti. Jako potenciální řešení zkoumáme nedávno zavedené metody debiacingu pro datové sady a modely klasifikace textů aplikované na detekci toxického jazyka. Zaměřujeme se na lexikální (např. nadávky, urážky, zmínky o identitě) a dialektální značky (konkrétně Afroamerická angličtina). Naše komplexní experimenty zjišťují, že existující metody jsou omezeny schopností prevence zkresleného chování v současných detektorech toxicity. Následně navrhujeme automatickou metodu korekce dat orientovanou na dialekt jako proof-of-concept. Navzdory použití syntetických etiket tato metoda snižuje dialektální asociace s toxicitou. Celkově naše zjištění ukazují, že odstranění modelu trénovaného na zaujatých toxických jazykových datech není tak účinné jako jednoduché přepracování dat k odstranění existujících zaujatostí.', 'bn': 'বাইজেড সংস্থা ব্যাক্সিক ভাষা খুঁজে বের করার জন্য ক্লাসিফারদের উন্নয়নের চ্যালেঞ্জ হিসেবে একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ। সম্ভাব্য সমাধান হিসেবে আমরা সম্প্রতি তদন্ত করি টেক্সট ক্লাস্ফিকেশন ডাটাসেট এবং মডেলের জন্য বিভ্রান্ত পদ্ধতি বিভ্রান্ত করার জন আমাদের মনোযোগ লেক্সিকাল (উদাহরণস্বরূপ শপথ, শপথ, গুপ্তচর, পরিচয়পত্রের কথা) এবং ডায়ালেক্টাল চার্ক (বিশেষ করে আফ্রিকান আমাদের সম্পূর্ণ পরীক্ষা নিশ্চিত করেছে যে বর্তমান ব্যাক্তিগত ডিটেক্টরের বিদ্রোহী আচরণ প্রতিরোধের ক্ষমতায় বিদ্র তারপর আমরা একটি স্বয়ংক্রিয়, ডায়ালেক-সচেতন তথ্য সংস্কার পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি, একটি প্রমাণ হিসেবে। সিন্টেটিক লেবেল ব্যবহার করা সত্ত্বেও, এই পদ্ধতি ব্যথার সাথে ডায়ালেক্টাল সংস্থা কমিয়ে দেয়। সাধারণত, আমাদের আবিস্কার দেখা যাচ্ছে যে বিদ্রোহী ভাষার তথ্যে প্রশিক্ষিত একটি মডেল বিভ্রান্ত করার প্রশিক্ষা করা হয়েছে তা কার্য', 'et': 'Poollikud seosed on olnud väljakutseks toksilise keele tuvastamiseks mõeldud klassifitseerijate väljatöötamisel, mis takistab nii õiglust kui ka täpsust. Võimalike lahendustena uurime hiljuti kasutusele võetud tekstiklassifikatsiooni andmekogumite ja mudelite debiaseerimismeetodeid, mida rakendatakse toksiliste keelte tuvastamisel. Meie fookus on leksikaalsed (nt vandussõnad, sõnad, identiteedi mainimine) ja dialektilised markerid (täpsemalt afroameerika inglise keel). Meie põhjalikud katsed näitavad, et olemasolevad meetodid on piiratud nende võime vältida kallutatud käitumist praeguste toksilisuse detektorite puhul. Seejärel pakume välja automaatse dialektiteadliku andmete parandamise meetodi kontseptsiooni tõestuseks. Hoolimata sünteetiliste märgiste kasutamisest vähendab see meetod dialektilisi seoseid toksilisusega. Kokkuvõttes näitavad meie tulemused, et kallutatud toksiliste keelte andmete põhjal koolitatud mudeli kõrvaldamine ei ole nii efektiivne kui lihtsalt andmete uuesti salvestamine olemasolevate kallutamatute kõrvaldamiseks.', 'fi': 'Puolueelliset assosiaatiot ovat olleet haaste myrkyllisen kielen havaitsemiseen käytettävien luokittelijoiden kehittämisessä, mikä on haitannut sekä oikeudenmukaisuutta että tarkkuutta. Mahdollisina ratkaisuina tutkimme äskettäin käyttöön otettuja tekstiluokitusaineistojen ja -mallien debiasing-menetelmiä myrkyllisten kielten havaitsemiseen. Keskitymme sanastoon (esim. kirosanoja, herjauksia, identiteetin mainintoja) ja dialektisiin merkkeihin (erityisesti afroamerikkalainen englanti). Kattavat kokeemme osoittavat, että nykyisillä menetelmillä on rajallinen kyky ehkäistä vääristynyttä käyttäytymistä nykyisissä myrkyllisyydenilmaisimissa. Tämän jälkeen ehdotamme automaattista murretietoista tiedonkorjausmenetelmää konseptin todistamiseksi. Synteettisistä merkinnöistä huolimatta tämä menetelmä vähentää dialektisia yhteyksiä myrkyllisyyteen. Kaiken kaikkiaan tutkimustuloksemme osoittavat, että harhaanjohtavaan myrkylliseen kieliaineistoon koulutetun mallin heikentäminen ei ole yhtä tehokasta kuin tietojen uudelleenkuvaaminen olemassa olevien harhaanjohtavien vaikutusten poistamiseksi.', 'ha': "Biased associations have been a challenge in the development of classifiers for detecting toxic language, hindering both fairness and accuracy.  Kama masu fassarawa masu yiwuwa, za mu yi ƙidãya a yanzu na hanyoyin yin ɓarna wa matsayin tsari da misãlai, kamar an applied zuwa gane lugha mai toyi. Fokusiyarmu yana kan leksiya (misali, magana, abubuwa, masu ambaci sunan shaidar) da masu yin diafaka (haske'an Ingiriya Kiafrika). Kayan jarrabai masu ƙaranci sun tabbatar cẽwa, metoden da ke cikin an ƙunsa da awon su iya hani ga haramtar aikin da aka haramta a cikin masu hanyõyin mataki na yanzu. Sa'an nan muna goyyar da wata hanyor shiryarwa na farat ɗaya da ke iya sani, kamar wata tabbatarwa na-zato. Babu amfani da alama na synthetic, wannan metode yana ƙara associations na dialakar da toisi. Haƙĩƙa, fassararmu za'a nuna cewa yin gaugãwa da wata motel wanda aka yi wa shirin da shi a kan harshen giftiya ba ta zama mai amfani ba kamar an motsar data don ya zama mai amfani kawai da kwamfyuta kan tafiyar da taƙaita masu jira.", 'sk': 'Prizadevanja so bila izziv pri razvoju klasifikatorjev za odkrivanje strupenih jezikov, kar ovira pravičnost in natančnost. Kot potencialne rešitve raziskujemo pred kratkim uvedene metode debiasing za besedilne klasifikacijske nabore podatkov in modele, ki se uporabljajo pri odkrivanju strupenih jezikov. Osredotočamo se na leksikalne (npr. preklinjanje, obrekovanje, omembe identitete) in narečne označevalce (zlasti afroameriško angleščino). Naši obsežni poskusi ugotavljajo, da so obstoječe metode omejene v sposobnosti preprečevanja pristranskega vedenja v trenutnih detektorjih toksičnosti. Nato predlagamo avtomatsko metodo popravka podatkov, ki se zaveda narečja, kot dokaz koncepta. Kljub uporabi sintetičnih oznak ta metoda zmanjšuje dialektične povezave s toksičnostjo. Na splošno naše ugotovitve kažejo, da obremenitev modela, usposobljenega za pristranske podatke o toksičnih jezikih, ni tako učinkovita kot preprosto ponovno beleženje podatkov za odstranitev obstoječih pristranskosti.', 'he': 'Biased associations have been a challenge in the development of classifiers for detecting toxic language, hindering both fairness and accuracy.  בתור פתרונות פוטנציאליים, אנו חוקרים שיטות התעללות שהופכו לאחרונה לקבוצות נתונים מסווגים טקסטים ומודלים, כפי שהופכו לזהות שפות רעילות. המרכז שלנו הוא על לקסיקה (למשל, מילים נשבעות, סלורים, זיכרונות זהות) וסימנים דיאלקטאליים (במיוחד אנגלית אפריקאית אמריקאית). הניסויים המרכיבים שלנו מצביעים ששיטות קיימות מוגבלות ביכולת שלהם למנוע התנהגות משותפת במגלי רעילות הנוכחים. ואז אנו מציעים שיטת תיקון נתונים אוטומטית, מודעת לחיאלקט, כהוכחה של מושג. Despite the use of synthetic labels, this method reduces dialectal associations with toxicity.  באופן כללי, הממצאים שלנו מראים שמדגם שמתאמן על נתוני שפת רעילות משותפים אינו יעילים כמו פשוט להחזיר את המידע כדי להסיר את ההתמחות קיימות.', 'jv': 'Asociations biasa Sampeyan gambar perusahaan, kita sumulakno nggunakake sistem debian nggawe dataset karo model, kawula nggunakake perusahaan kanggo kebutuhan langgambar toksisa Awakdhéwé nglanggar langgambar (adil. njuk-ngomongke, njuk-ngomongke, dino-ngomongke) lan dino-ngomongke dialectal. Awak dhéwé éntuk akeh perbudhakan kanggo ngerasai yèn kuwi bisa nguasai perbudhakan kanggo ngerasai winih dhéwé. Awak dhéwé We unye siji-siji karo sistem omatik, dialecto-awake data justification method, nganggep sistem-of-contep politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Lakok, akeh mbukak punika dipungot kuwi, Debian kuwi model sing berarti perusahaan anyar tentang kanggo langkung bantuan ingkang tok.', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་གཉིས་ཆེ་བ་ནི་གནད་དོན་གཅིག་ནི་དབུས་ཡིག་ཆ་རྙེད་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་རིམ་གྱི་གནད་དོན་ཞིག་ཡོད། ཐོབ་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་འགྱུར་བ་ཡིན་པ་ལས། འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཉེ་ཆར་དུ་ཡིག་གེ་དབྱེ་བ་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐབས ང་ཚོའི་ཕྱོགས་སྟོན་ནི་ཡིག་རྟགས་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་ཟད་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་པར་ཕྱོགས་ཡོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་གནས་ཚུལ་འདི་ཁོང་ཚོའི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ཉེན་ཁ་ཡོད་པ་དང་། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་dialect-aware་ཡོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་བསམ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Despite the use of synthetic labels, this method reduces dialectal associations with toxicity. ཡོངས་རྫོགས་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་མི་མཐུན་པས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་གནད་དོན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག'}
{'en': 'Detecting Scenes in Fiction : A new Segmentation Task', 'ar': 'اكتشاف المشاهد في الخيال: مهمة تجزئة جديدة', 'fr': 'Détecter les scènes de fiction\xa0: une nouvelle tâche de segmentation', 'pt': 'Detectando cenas na ficção: uma nova tarefa de segmentação', 'es': 'Detección de escenas en ficción: una nueva tarea de segmentación', 'ja': 'フィクションのシーンの検出：新しいセグメンテーションタスク', 'zh': '检小说中景,新分职', 'hi': 'फिक्शन में दृश्यों का पता लगाना: एक नया विभाजन कार्य', 'ru': 'Обнаружение сцен в художественной литературе: новая задача сегментации', 'ga': 'Radhairc a Bhrath i bhFicsean: Tasc nua Deighilte', 'ka': 'ფაიქციის სკენების განახლება: ახალი სეგენტიკაციის დავალება', 'hu': 'Jelenetek észlelése a fikcióban: Új szegmentációs feladat', 'el': 'Ανίχνευση σκηνών στη φαντασία: Μια νέα εργασία τμηματοποίησης', 'kk': 'Түзетілген сұлбаларды анықтау: Жаңа сегментация тапсырмасы', 'lt': 'Comment', 'it': 'Rilevare scene nella finzione: una nuova attività di segmentazione', 'mk': 'Детектирање сцени во фикција: A new Segmentation Task', 'ml': 'ഫിക്ഷനിലെ സ്കേനുകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നു: A new Segmentation Task', 'mn': 'Шинэ хэлбэрийн тодорхойлолтыг мэдэх: Шинэ хэлбэрийн үйл ажиллагаа', 'no': 'Oppdagar skjenar i fikksjon: Eit ny segmentasjonsprogram', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie scen w fikcji: nowe zadanie segmentacyjne', 'ro': 'Detectarea scenelor în ficțiune: O nouă sarcină de segmentare', 'ms': 'Mengesan adegan dalam Fiksi: A new Segmentation Task', 'mt': 'Is-Sejbien tax-Xenarji fil-Fizzjoni: Kompitu ġdid ta’ Segmentazzjoni', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje scena u fikciji: novi segmentacijski zadatak', 'so': 'Shaqooyin la xiriira sawirada: Shaqooyin cusub ee qeybinta', 'si': 'ස්ථාපනයේ ස්කීන් හොයාගන්න: අළුත් සෙග්මෙන්ටම් කාර්ය', 'sv': 'Att upptäcka scener i fiktion: En ny segmenteringsuppgift', 'ta': 'புதிய பிரிவின் வரையறைகளை கண்டறி', 'ur': 'فصل میں صحیح پتچا رہی ہے: ایک نوی سپٹمنٹ ٹاکس', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phát hiện cảnh ở Fiction: Một nhiệm vụ phân đoạn mới', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje scena u fikciji: novi zadatak segmentacije', 'bg': 'Откриване на сцени в фантастика: нова задача за сегментиране', 'da': 'Registrering af scener i fiktion: En ny segmenteringsopgave', 'nl': 'Scènes detecteren in fictie: een nieuwe segmentatietaak', 'de': 'Szenen in Fiktion erkennen: Eine neue Segmentierungsaufgabe', 'fa': 'شناسایی صحنه در تعمیر: یک کار جدید جدیدی', 'ko': '소설의 장면 탐색: 새로운 분할 작업', 'sw': 'Kugundua Sayansi katika Tamko: Hifadhi mpya ya Kugawa', 'id': 'Deteksi TKP dalam Fiksi: Tugas Segmentasi Baru', 'tr': 'Däşemeler fedilýär: Täze Segmentation Görevi', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'hy': 'Ֆիկցիայի մեջ բնույթներ հայտնաբերելը: A New', 'az': 'Fiksiyada sahələri keşif: Yeni Segmentasyon Görüş', 'bn': 'Detecting Scenes in Fiction: A new Segmentation Task', 'af': "Beskry Skenote in Fiksie: ' n nuwe Segmentasie Opdrag", 'ca': 'Detectar escenes en ficció: Una nova tasca de segmentació', 'et': 'Stseenide tuvastamine fiktsioonis: uus segmenteerimise ülesanne', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje scena u fikciji: novi segmentacijski zadatak', 'cs': 'Detekce scén ve fikci: nový úkol segmentace', 'fi': 'Kohtausten havaitseminen fiktiossa: uusi segmentointitehtävä', 'sq': 'Duke zbuluar skenat në fikcion: A new Segmentation Task', 'he': 'גילוי סצינות בפיקציה: A new Segmentation Task', 'sk': 'Zaznavanje scen v fikciji: novo opravilo segmentacije', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'bo': 'རན་སྐུལ་ནང་གི་མིང་རྟགས་བཙལ་བ: ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་གསར་པ་ཞིག་'}
{'en': 'This paper introduces the novel task of scene segmentation on narrative texts and provides an annotated corpus, a discussion of the linguistic and narrative properties of the task and baseline experiments towards automatic solutions. A scene here is a segment of the text where time and discourse time are more or less equal, the narration focuses on one action and location and character constellations stay the same. The corpus we describe consists of German-language dime novels (550k tokens) that have been annotated in parallel, achieving an inter-annotator agreement of gamma = 0.7. Baseline experiments using BERT achieve an F1 score of 24 %, showing that the task is very challenging. An automatic scene segmentation paves the way towards processing longer narrative texts like tales or novels by breaking them down into smaller, coherent and meaningful parts, which is an important stepping stone towards the reconstruction of plot in Computational Literary Studies but also can serve to improve tasks like coreference resolution.', 'fr': "Cet article présente la nouvelle tâche de segmentation de scènes sur des textes narratifs et fournit un corpus annoté, une discussion des propriétés linguistiques et narratives de la tâche et des expériences de base vers des solutions automatiques. Une scène ici est un segment du texte où le temps et le temps de discours sont plus ou moins égaux, la narration se concentre sur une action et un lieu et les constellations de personnages restent les mêmes. Le corpus que nous décrivons est constitué de romans de dix cents en langue allemande (550 000 jetons) qui ont été annotés en parallèle, obtenant un accord inter-annotateur de gamma = 0,7. Les expériences de référence utilisant BERT ont obtenu un score F1 de 24\xa0%, ce qui montre que la tâche est très difficile. Une segmentation automatique des scènes ouvre la voie au traitement de textes narratifs plus longs, tels que des contes ou des romans, en les décomposant en parties plus petites, cohérentes et significatives, ce qui constitue un tremplin important vers la reconstruction de l'intrigue dans les études littéraires computationnelles, mais peut également servir à améliorer des tâches comme la résolution de coréférence.", 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة المهمة الجديدة لتجزئة المشهد على النصوص السردية وتوفر مجموعة مشروحة ومناقشة للخصائص اللغوية والسردية للمهمة والتجارب الأساسية نحو الحلول التلقائية. المشهد هنا هو جزء من النص حيث يكون الوقت ووقت الخطاب متساويين إلى حد ما ، ويركز السرد على فعل واحد وتبقى الأبراج الشخصية والمكان كما هي. تتكون المجموعة التي وصفناها من روايات الدايم باللغة الألمانية (550 ألفًا) التي تم شرحها بالتوازي ، وتحقيق اتفاقية بين المعلقين من جاما = 0.7. تحقق تجارب خط الأساس باستخدام BERT درجة F1 بنسبة 24 ٪ ، مما يدل على أن المهمة صعبة للغاية. يمهد التقسيم التلقائي للمشهد الطريق نحو معالجة النصوص السردية الأطول مثل الحكايات أو الروايات عن طريق تقسيمها إلى أجزاء أصغر ومتماسكة وذات مغزى ، وهي خطوة مهمة نحو إعادة بناء الحبكة في الدراسات الأدبية الحاسوبية ولكن يمكن أيضًا أن تعمل على تحسين المهام مثل قرار Coreference.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta la novedosa tarea de segmentación de escenas en textos narrativos y proporciona un corpus anotado, una discusión de las propiedades lingüísticas y narrativas de la tarea y experimentos de referencia hacia soluciones automáticas. Una escena aquí es un segmento del texto donde el tiempo y el tiempo del discurso son más o menos iguales, la narración se centra en una acción y ubicación y las constelaciones de personajes permanecen invariables. El corpus que describimos consiste en novelas de diez centavos en alemán (550 000 fichas) que se han anotado en paralelo, logrando un acuerdo entre anotadores de gamma = 0.7. Los experimentos de referencia con BERT alcanzan una puntuación F1 del 24%, lo que demuestra que la tarea es muy desafiante. Una segmentación automática de escenas allana el camino para procesar textos narrativos más largos, como cuentos o novelas, al dividirlos en partes más pequeñas, coherentes y significativas, lo que es un paso importante hacia la reconstrucción de la trama en los Estudios Literarios Computacionales, pero también puede servir para mejorar tareas como la resolución de correferencias.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta a nova tarefa de segmentação de cenas em textos narrativos e fornece um corpus anotado, uma discussão das propriedades linguísticas e narrativas da tarefa e experimentos de linha de base para soluções automáticas. Uma cena aqui é um segmento do texto onde o tempo e o tempo do discurso são mais ou menos iguais, a narração se concentra em uma ação e a localização e as constelações de personagens permanecem as mesmas. O corpus que descrevemos consiste em romances dime de língua alemã (550k tokens) que foram anotados em paralelo, alcançando uma concordância inter-anotador de gama = 0,7. Experimentos de linha de base usando BERT atingem uma pontuação F1 de 24%, mostrando que a tarefa é muito desafiadora. Uma segmentação automática de cenas abre caminho para o processamento de textos narrativos mais longos, como contos ou romances, dividindo-os em partes menores, coerentes e significativas, o que é um passo importante para a reconstrução do enredo nos Estudos Literários Computacionais, mas também pode servir para melhorar as tarefas como resolução de correferência.', 'ja': 'この論文では、物語テキストのシーンセグメンテーションの新規タスクを紹介し、注釈付きコーパス、タスクの言語的および物語的特性の議論、および自動解決に向けたベースライン実験を提供する。 ここでのシーンは、時間と話題時間がほぼ等しく、ナレーションが1つのアクションに焦点を当て、場所とキャラクターの星座が同じままであるテキストのセグメントです。 私たちが説明するコーパスは、並行して注釈が付けられたドイツ語のダイムノベル（ 55万トークン）で構成されており、ガンマ= 0.7の注釈者間合意を達成しています。 BERTを使用したベースライン実験は、F 1スコア24 ％を達成し、タスクが非常に困難であることを示しています。 自動シーンセグメンテーションは、物語や小説のようなより長い物語テキストを、より小さく、一貫性のある、意味のある部分に分解することによって処理するための道を開きます。これは、計算文学研究におけるプロットの再構築への重要な足がかりですが、コアリファレンス解決のようなタスクを改善するのにも役立ちます。', 'zh': '本文引叙事文本上场景分割新务,并给一注语料库,讨论言语叙事性及自解决方案之基线实验。 此一场文本一段,其间日月多少相等,叙集一动,地与人物星坐不变。 语料库由德语小说(550k令牌)成,此小说已并行注释,成伽马= 0.7注者间一也。 用BERT者基线实验至24%F1分,明其事甚挑战性。 自分故事、小说等叙事文本分解为更小,贯有义者,为理长叙事文本铺平道路,此计文重建情节之要垫脚石,然亦有助于改善协同者也。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर कथा ग्रंथों पर दृश्य विभाजन के उपन्यास कार्य का परिचय देता है और एक एनोटेट कॉर्पस प्रदान करता है, कार्य के भाषाई और कथा गुणों की चर्चा और स्वचालित समाधानों की दिशा में बेसलाइन प्रयोग। यहां एक दृश्य पाठ का एक खंड है जहां समय और प्रवचन समय कमोबेश बराबर हैं, कथन एक क्रिया और स्थान पर केंद्रित है और चरित्र नक्षत्र समान रहते हैं। हमारे द्वारा वर्णित कॉर्पस में जर्मन-भाषा के डाइम उपन्यास (550k टोकन) शामिल हैं जिन्हें समानांतर में एनोटेट किया गया है, गामा = 0.7 के अंतर-एनोटेटर समझौते को प्राप्त करना। BERT का उपयोग करके बेसलाइन प्रयोग 24% का F1 स्कोर प्राप्त करते हैं, यह दिखाते हुए कि कार्य बहुत चुनौतीपूर्ण है। एक स्वचालित दृश्य विभाजन कहानियों या उपन्यासों जैसे लंबे समय तक कथा ग्रंथों को छोटे, सुसंगत और सार्थक भागों में तोड़कर संसाधित करने की दिशा में मार्ग प्रशस्त करता है, जो कम्प्यूटेशनल साहित्यिक अध्ययन में साजिश के पुनर्निर्माण की दिशा में एक महत्वपूर्ण कदम पत्थर है, लेकिन यह भी coreference संकल्प जैसे कार्यों में सुधार करने के लिए काम कर सकता है।', 'ru': 'Эта статья представляет новую задачу сегментации сцены на повествовательных текстах и предоставляет аннотированный корпус, обсуждение лингвистических и повествовательных свойств задачи и базовые эксперименты в направлении автоматических решений. Сцена здесь - это сегмент текста, где время и время дискурса более или менее равны, повествование фокусируется на одном действии, а местоположение и созвездия персонажей остаются одинаковыми. Корпус, который мы описываем, состоит из немецкоязычных романов (токенов 550k), которые были аннотированы параллельно, достигая соглашения между аннотаторами гамма = 0,7. Исходные эксперименты с использованием BERT дают оценку F1 24%, показывая, что задача очень сложная. Автоматическая сегментация сцены прокладывает путь к обработке более длинных повествовательных текстов, таких как сказки или романы, разбивая их на более мелкие, последовательные и значимые части, что является важным шагом на пути к реконструкции сюжета в вычислительных литературных исследованиях, но также может служить для улучшения таких задач, как разрешение ядра.', 'ga': 'Tugann an páipéar seo tús le tasc nua-dheighilt radharc ar théacsanna insinte agus soláthraíonn sé corpas anótáilte, plé ar airíonna teangeolaíocha agus inste an taisc agus turgnaimh bhonnlíne i dtreo réitigh uathoibríocha. Is éard atá i radharc anseo ná teascán den téacs ina bhfuil an t-am agus an t-am dioscúrsa ar comhchéim a bheag nó a mhór, díríonn an scéal ar aicsean amháin agus áit a bhfanann réaltbhuíonta carachtar mar a chéile. Is éard atá sa chorpas a ndéanaimid cur síos air ná úrscéalta dime Gearmánacha (550k comhartha) atá anótáilte go comhuaineach, ag baint amach comhaontú idir-anótaire de gháma = 0.7. Baineann turgnaimh bhonnlíne a úsáideann BERT scór F1 de 24% amach, rud a léiríonn go bhfuil an tasc an-dúshlánach. Réitíonn deighilt radharc uathoibríoch an bealach chun téacsanna insinte níos faide ar nós scéalta nó úrscéalta a phróiseáil trí iad a bhriseadh síos i gcodanna níos lú, comhleanúnach agus brí, rud atá ina chéim thábhachtach i dtreo athchruthú plota sa Staidéar Liteartha Ríomhaireachta ach is féidir leis freisin feabhas a chur ar thascanna. cosúil le réiteach croíchomhdhála.', 'hu': 'A cikk bemutatja a narrat챠v sz철vegek jelenetszegment찼ci처j찼nak 첬jszer킥 feladat찼t 챕s jegyzetelt korpuszt, a feladat nyelvi 챕s narrat챠v tulajdons찼gainak megvitat찼s찼t, valamint az automatikus megold찼sok fel챕 ir찼nyul처 alapk챠s챕rleteket. Egy jelenet itt a sz철veg egy olyan szegmense, ahol az id흷 챕s a diskurzusid흷 t철bb챕-kev챕sb챕 egyenl흷, a narr찼ci처 egy cselekv챕sre 철sszpontos챠t, 챕s a helysz챠n 챕s a karakterk챕pek ugyanazok maradnak. Az 찼ltalunk le챠rt korpusz n챕met nyelv킥 dime reg챕nyekb흷l (550k tokenekb흷l) 찼ll, amelyeket p찼rhuzamosan megjegyeztek, 챠gy a gamma = 0,7 k철z철tti meg찼llapod찼st eredm챕nyezve. A BERT alkalmaz찼s찼val v챕gzett alapk챠s챕rletek 24%-os F1 pontsz찼mot 챕rnek el, ami azt mutatja, hogy a feladat nagyon kih챠v찼st jelent. Az automatikus jelenetszegment찼ci처 kisebb, koherens 챕s 챕rtelmes r챕szekre bontva megk철nny챠ti az utat a hosszabb elbesz챕l흷 sz철vegek feldolgoz찼s찼hoz, mint p챕ld찼ul a mes챕k vagy reg챕nyek, ami fontos l챕p챕sk철vet jelent a komputer찼ci처s irodalomtudom찼nyok cselekm챕ny챕nek rekonstrukci처j찼hoz, de olyan feladatok jav챠t찼s찼hoz is, mint a coreferencia felbont찼s.', 'el': "Η παρούσα εργασία εισάγει το νέο έργο της τμηματοποίησης σκηνών σε αφηγηματικά κείμενα και παρέχει ένα σχολιασμένο σώμα, μια συζήτηση των γλωσσικών και αφηγηματικών ιδιοτήτων της εργασίας και τα βασικά πειράματα προς αυτόματες λύσεις. Μια σκηνή εδώ είναι ένα τμήμα του κειμένου όπου ο χρόνος και ο χρόνος ομιλίας είναι περισσότερο ή λιγότερο ίσοι, η αφήγηση επικεντρώνεται σε μια δράση και τοποθεσία και οι αστερισμοί χαρακτήρων παραμένουν ίδιοι. Το σώμα που περιγράφουμε αποτελείται από γερμανικά μυθιστορήματα δεκάρας (μάρκες 550κ) που έχουν σχολιαστεί παράλληλα, επιτυγχάνοντας μια συμφωνία μεταξύ σχολιαστών γ'0.7. Τα πειράματα βάσης που χρησιμοποιούν το BERT επιτυγχάνουν βαθμολογία F1 24%, δείχνοντας ότι το έργο είναι πολύ δύσκολο. Μια αυτόματη τμηματοποίηση σκηνών ανοίγει το δρόμο για την επεξεργασία μακρύτερων αφηγηματικών κειμένων, όπως παραμύθια ή μυθιστορήματα, διασπώντας τα σε μικρότερα, συνεκτικά και σημαντικά μέρη, γεγονός που αποτελεί σημαντικό βήμα για την ανασυγκρότηση της πλοκής στις Υπολογιστικές Λογοτεχνικές Σπουδές, αλλά μπορεί επίσης να χρησιμεύσει για τη βελτίωση των καθηκόντων όπως η επίλυση των συμπερασμάτων.", 'ka': 'ეს დოკუნტის პრომენტიური საქმენტის სექმენტის სექმენტის საქმენტის დაწყენება და აღმოჩნდება ანოტატიური კორპუსს, საქმენტის და ფექმენტიური ექმენტის განსაზღვრების ინგუმისტიური და სენი აქ არის ტექსტის სეგენტი, სადაც დრო და დისკურსის დრო უფრო ან ცოტა ტოლია, სიტყვები ერთი მოქმედებით და ადგილზე და სიტყვების სეგენტირებით იგივეა. კორპუსი, რომელიც ჩვენ აღწერეთ, consists of German-language dime novels (550k tokens), which have been annotated in parallel, achieving an inter-annotator agreement of gamma = 0.7. BERT-ის გამოყენებული ფერიმენტები გავაკეთებთ 24%-ის F1 წერტილი, რომელიც გამოჩვენება, რომ დავაკეთება მნიშვნელოვანია. ავტომატიკური სენეზმენტი სენეზმენტის გადაწყვეტილების გზა, როგორც ისტორიები ან პრომენები, რომლებიც მათ ცოტა, შესაძლებელი და მნიშვნელოვანი ნაწილში გადაწყვეტით, რომელიც უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი კომპუტაციალური ლიტერარიური სწავლებში გადა', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз түсінікті мәтіндердің сәйкестік сегментациясының романдық тапсырмасын таңдап, автоматты шешімдерге қатынау үшін түсінікті корпус, тапсырманың лингвистикалық және түсінікті қасиеттерін тал Мұнда уақыт мен дискурстар уақыты бірнеше немесе кем тең болатын мәтіннің сегменті. Оқиғалар бір әрекет мен орналасуы мен таңбалар жұлдыздарына бірдей болады. Біз түсіндірген корпус неміс тілдерінің деңгей романдарынан (550k токен) болады. Бұл параллельде белгіленген, гамма = 0 BERT қолданылатын негізгі тәжірибелер, тапсырманың көп қызықтығын көрсетеді. Автоматты сценаның сегментациясы, оқиғалар не романдар сияқты ұзындық мәтіндерді өзгерту жолын түсіндіреді. Бұл компьютерлік литератриялық зерттеулерінің қайта құрылуына маңызды түсіндіру керек, сондай-ақ тапсырмаларды қайта құру үшін көмектеседі.', 'it': "Questo articolo introduce il nuovo compito della segmentazione delle scene sui testi narrativi e fornisce un corpus annotato, una discussione delle proprietà linguistiche e narrative del compito e esperimenti di base verso soluzioni automatiche. Una scena qui è un segmento del testo in cui il tempo e il tempo del discorso sono più o meno uguali, la narrazione si concentra su un'azione e le costellazioni di luoghi e personaggi rimangono le stesse. Il corpus che descriviamo è costituito da romanzi dime in lingua tedesca (550k token) che sono stati annotati in parallelo, ottenendo un accordo inter-annotatore di gamma = 0,7. Gli esperimenti di base con BERT raggiungono un punteggio F1 del 24%, dimostrando che il compito è molto impegnativo. Una segmentazione automatica delle scene apre la strada all'elaborazione di testi narrativi più lunghi come racconti o romanzi scomponendoli in parti più piccole, coerenti e significative, che è un importante passo avanti verso la ricostruzione della trama negli studi letterari computazionali, ma può anche servire a migliorare compiti come la risoluzione della coreferenza.", 'mk': 'This paper introduces the novel task of scene segmentation on narrative texts and provides an annotated corpus, a discussion of the linguistic and narrative properties of the task and baseline experiments towards automatic solutions.  Сцена овде е сегмент на текстот каде времето и времето на дискурсот се повеќе или помалку еднакви, приказната се фокусира на една акција и локација и констелациите на знаци остануваат исти. Корпусот што го опишуваме се состои од германски романи со паралелно анотирани паралелно, постигнувајќи интеранотиран договор на гама = 0,7. Baseline experiments using BERT achieve an F1 score of 24%, showing that the task is very challenging.  Автоматска сегментација на сцената го отвора патот кон обработуваое на подолги раскажувачки тексти како приказни или романи преку разделуваое на помали, коерентни и значајни делови, што е важен чекор кон реконструкцијата на заговорот во Компутационалните литературни студии, но исто така може да служи за подобрување на задачите како ре', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d വിവരിച്ച പദാവലികളുടെ നോവല്\u200d ജോലിയെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. സ്വയം പരിഹരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് ഒരു കോര്\u200dപ്പസ് നല്\u200dകുന്നു. സമയവും സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സമയവും തുല്യമായിരിക്കുന്ന വാചകത്തിന്റെ ഒരു ഭാഗമാണിവിടെയുള്ളത്. ഈ സ്ഥാനം ഒരു പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനവും സ്ഥാനവും അക്ഷരമണ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d ഭാഷ ഡീമ് നോവലുകളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തിലാണ് (550 ലക്ഷം അടയാളങ്ങള്\u200d) അത് പാരാളലില്\u200d വിഷമിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കു ബെര്\u200dട്ടി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന അടിസ്ഥാന പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d 24% എഫ്\u200c1 സ്കോര്\u200d പ്രാപിക്കുന്നു. ഈ ജോലി വളരെ വിലപാടുകളാണെന് ഒരു സ്വയമില്ലാത്ത സ്ഥലത്തിന്റെ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d കഥകളെപ്പോലെയോ നോവലുകളെപ്പോലെയോ കഥകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിലേക്കുള്ള വഴിയുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. അവയെ ചെറിയ, കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ആവശ്യമുള്ള ഭാ', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatoma nauja scenos segmentacijos užduotis dėl narracinių tekstų ir pateikiamas anotuotas korpusas, diskusija apie užduoties kalbines ir narracines savybes ir pradiniai eksperimentai siekiant automatinių sprendimų. Čia scena yra teksto segmentas, kuriame laikas ir diskurso laikas yra lygūs arba mažesni, narracija sutelkiama į vieną veiksmą ir vietą, o simbolių žvaigždės išlieka vienodos. Mes apibūdinamą korpusą sudaro vokiečių kalbos dime romanai (550k simbolių), kurie buvo užrašyti lygiagrečiai ir pasiektas tarpanotatorių susitarimas gama = 0,7. Baseline experiments using BERT achieve an F1 score of 24%, showing that the task is very challenging.  Automatinė scenos segmentacija atveria kelią ilgesniems narraciniams tekstams, pavyzdžiui, pasakoms ar romanams, apdoroti suskirstant juos į mažesnes, nuoseklias ir prasmingas dalis, o tai yra svarbus žingsnis atstatyti plot ą kompiuterinių literatūros tyrimų metu, tačiau taip pat gali padėti pagerinti užduotis, pavyzdžiui, koreferencijos pertvarkymą.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jintroduċi l-kompitu ġdid tas-segmentazzjoni tax-xena dwar testi narrattivi u jipprovdi korpus annotat, diskussjoni dwar il-karatteristiċi lingwistiċi u narrattivi tal-kompitu u esperimenti ta’ linja bażi lejn soluzzjonijiet awtomatiċi. Xena hawnhekk hija segment tat-test fejn il-ħin u l-ħin ta’ diskors huma aktar jew inqas ugwali, id-narrazzjoni tiffoka fuq azzjoni waħda u l-post u l-kostellazzjonijiet tal-karattri jibqgħu l-istess. Il-korpus li niddeskrivu jikkonsisti f’romanji bil-lingwa Ġermaniża (550k tokens) li ġew annotati b’mod parallel, li jiksbu ftehim bejn l-annotaturi ta’ gamma = 0.7. L-esperimenti fil-linja bażi bl-użu tal-BERT jilħqu punteġġ F1 ta’ 24%, li juri li l-kompitu huwa sfida ħafna. Segmentazzjoni awtomatika tax-xena twitti t-triq lejn l-ipproċessar ta’ testi narrattivi itwal bħal storji jew romanzi billi taqsamhom f’partijiet iżgħar, koerenti u sinifikanti, li huwa pass importanti lejn ir-rikostruzzjoni ta’ plot fi Studji Litterarji Komputattivi iżda jista’ jservi wkoll biex itejjeb il-kompiti bħar-riżoluzzjoni tal-koreferenza.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас зохиолын текстүүд дээрх сценийн загварын шинэ даалгаварыг тайлбарлаж, автоматик шийдэл руу дамжуулдаг корпус, хэлний болон түүхийн тухай ярилцлага өгдөг. Хугацаа, ярианы цаг ихээр эсвэл бага тэнцүү байдаг текстийн нэг хэсэг юм. Бидний тайлбарлаж байгаа корпус нь герман хэлний зуу зохиолууд (550k тэмдэгт) байдаг. Гамма = 0.7 гэдэг анзаарагчийн зөвшөөрөл гарч ирсэн. BERT-г ашиглан суурь шугам туршилтууд F1-ийн хувь нь 24%-тай гарч ирнэ. Энэ үйл ажил маш хэцүү гэдгийг харуулж байна. Автоматик сценийн загвар нь түүх эсвэл зохиолууд шиг урт зохиолын бичгийг ажиллаж, жижиг, нийгмийн, утгатай хэсэгт хувааж, компьютерийн Литературын судалгаанд дахин сэргээгдэх чухал чулуу юм. Мөн тэдгээрийг сайхан шийдвэрлэлт шийдвэрлэхэд тусалдаг.', 'no': 'Denne papiret introduserer den novelle oppgåva av scenærsegmentasjonen på narrativ tekstar og tilbyr ein merknad korpus, eit diskusjon av dei lingviske og narrative eigenskapane til oppgåva og baseline eksperimentane mot automatiske løysing. Ein scene her er eit segment av teksten der tid og diskurstid er meir eller mindre lik, og narrasjonen fokuserer på ein handling og plassering og teiknstillingar blir same. Korpusen vi beskriver inneheld av tysk-språk dime-romanar (550k teikn) som har blitt markert i parallell, og når det gjer eit inter-annotator-avtale av gamma = 0,7. Baseline eksperimenter med BERT oppnår ein F1- poeng på 24%, viser at oppgåva er veldig vanskeleg. Eit automatisk segmentasjon av scenen gjer måten til å handsama lengre historiske tekstar som historiar eller novelar ved å dele dei ned i mindre, koherent og meningsdeler, som er ein viktig steg mot rekonstruksjonen av plott i databokstavar, men kan også gjere å forbetra oppgåver som oppløysing av koreferanse.', 'pl': "Niniejszy artykuł przedstawia nowe zadanie segmentacji sceny na tekstach narracyjnych i zawiera korpus adnotacyjny, dyskusję na temat językowych i narracyjnych właściwości zadania oraz eksperymenty podstawowe w kierunku automatycznych rozwiązań. Scena jest tutaj fragmentem tekstu, w którym czas i czas dyskursji są mniej lub bardziej równe, narracja skupia się na jednym działaniu i lokalizacji, a konstelacje postaci pozostają takie same. Opisany przez nas korpus składa się z niemieckojęzycznych powieści (żetonów 550k), które zostały równolegle adnotacjonowane, osiągając porozumienie między anotatorami gamma'0.7. Eksperymenty bazowe z wykorzystaniem BERT osiągają wynik F1 24%, pokazując, że zadanie jest bardzo wymagające. Automatyczna segmentacja scen toruje drogę do przetwarzania dłuższych tekstów narracyjnych, takich jak opowieści czy powieści, podzielając je na mniejsze, spójne i znaczące części, co jest ważnym krokiem w kierunku rekonstrukcji fabuły w obliczeniowych studiach literackich, ale może również służyć poprawie zadań, takich jak rozwiązywanie współdzielności.", 'ro': 'Lucrarea prezintă sarcina nouă de segmentare a scenei pe texte narative și oferă un corpus adnotat, o discuție a proprietăților lingvistice și narative ale sarcinii și experimente de bază spre soluții automate. O scenă aici este un segment al textului în care timpul și timpul discursului sunt mai mult sau mai puțin egale, narațiunea se concentrează pe o acțiune și locația și constelațiile personajelor rămân aceleași. Corpusul pe care îl descriem constă din romane de dime în limba germană (550k jetoane) care au fost adnotate în paralel, obținând un acord inter-adnotator de gamma = 0,7. Experimentele de bază folosind BERT obțin un scor F1 de 24%, arătând că sarcina este foarte provocatoare. O segmentare automată a scenei deschide calea către prelucrarea textelor narative mai lungi, cum ar fi povești sau romane, defalcându-le în părți mai mici, coerente și semnificative, ceea ce reprezintă un pas important către reconstrucția complotului în Studiile Literare Computaționale, dar, de asemenea, poate servi la îmbunătățirea sarcinilor precum rezoluția coreferenței.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja novi zadatak segmentacije scene na prièanim tekstima i pruža annotiranu korpusu, diskusiju o jezičkim i prièanim svojstvima zadatka i početnih eksperimenata prema automatskim rješenjima. Scena ovde je segment teksta u kojem je vreme vremena i diskursije više ili manje jednako, prièa se fokusira na jednu akciju i lokaciju i karakterne zvijezde ostaju iste. Korpus koji opisujemo se sastoji od njemačkih dimenih romana (550k znakova) koji su paralelno annotirani, ostvarivši inter-annotatorski sporazum game = 0,7. Početni eksperiment koristeći BERT postiže rezultat F1 od 24%, pokazujući da je zadatak veoma izazovan. Automatična segmentacija scena otvara put ka obradu dužih priče ili romana, razdvojivajući ih u manje, saslušne i smislene dijelove, što je važan stepenik prema rekonstrukciji ploča u računalnim literarnim studijama, ali takođe može služiti poboljšavanju zadataka poput rezolucije ljubaznosti.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ ස්ථානය සංචාර්ය පැත්තක් වලින් සංචාර්ය සංචාර්ය වැඩසටහන් පෙනුම් කරනවා, ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය විසඳුම් වලින් භාෂාවි Name අපි විස්තර කරන කොර්පස් එක්ක ජර්මාන් භාෂාවේ සිම් සංවිධානය (550k ටෝකන්ස්) සමාන්\u200dය විස්තර කරලා තියෙන්නේ ජර්මාන් භාෂාවේ සංව BERT භාවිතා වෙනුවෙන් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා F1 ප්\u200dරමාණයක් 24% වෙනුවෙන් ලැබෙනවා, වැඩේ ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්න ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය ස්ථානයක් පාලනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙනුවෙන් ලොකු කතාවක් වගේ කතාවක් නැති කතාවක් වගේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන', 'so': 'Qoraalkan wuxuu soo bandhigaa shaqada saxda ee ku saabsan qoraalka taariikhda islamarkaasna wuxuu ka dhigaa koox la qallajiyey, kala sheekeysta xuquuqda luuqada iyo sheekooyinka shaqada iyo jirrabaadka hoose ee xafiiska bilowga ah. Halkan waxaa ku yaala qeyb ka mid ah qoraalka marka xilliga iyo wakhtiga hadalku ay ka badan yihiin isla mid ama ka yar yihiin, sawirku wuxuu ku focus yahay hal shaqo iyo meesha iyo hal xiliga xiddiguhu ay isku mid yihiin. Qoraxda aan ku qorno waxaa ka mid ah waraaqaha qarsoon oo afka Jarmalka ah (550k calaamado) oo lagu dhibaataysiiyey si lambar ah, oo heshiiska dhexe ee gamma = 0,7. Imtixaanka aasaasiga ah ee ku isticmaalaya BERT waxay gaadhaan koox F1 oo ah 24 boqolkiiba, wuxuuna tusayaa in shaqadu aad u tacliin yahay. Xiriirka dhaqdhaqaaqa ah ayaa si loo hagaajiyaa warqadaha sii badan sida sheekooyinka ama riwaayadaha, si uu u buriyo qaybaha yar, kooxaha iyo waxyaabaha muhiimka ah, kaas oo muhiim ah dhagxan ku socota dib u dhisidda qoraalka shahaadada ee xisaabta, laakiin sidoo kale wuxuu u adeegi karaa inuu horumariyo shaqaalaha sida xafiiska shaqada.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats introducerar den nya uppgiften med scensegmentering på narrativa texter och ger en kommenterad korpus, en diskussion om uppgiftens språkliga och narrativa egenskaper och baslinjeexperiment mot automatiska lösningar. En scen här är ett segment av texten där tid och diskurstid är mer eller mindre lika, berättandet fokuserar på en handling och plats och karaktärskonstellationer förblir desamma. Den korpus vi beskriver består av tyskspråkiga dimeromaner (550k tokens) som har kommenterats parallellt, vilket uppnår en inter-annotator överenskommelse om gamma = 0,7. Baseline experiment med BERT uppnår en F1-poäng på 24%, vilket visar att uppgiften är mycket utmanande. En automatisk scensegmentering banar väg för att bearbeta längre narrativa texter som sagor eller romaner genom att bryta ner dem i mindre, sammanhängande och meningsfulla delar, vilket är ett viktigt steg mot rekonstruktionen av plotten i Computational Literary Studies men också kan tjäna till att förbättra uppgifter som coreference resolution.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் காட்சி பிரிவின் புதிய பணியை குறிப்பிடுகிறது மற்றும் செய்தி தானியங்கி தீர்வுகளுக்கு ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பு, பணியின் மொழியில் மற் ஒரு காட்சி இங்கு ஒரு துண்டு உள்ளது நேரம் மற்றும் பேச்சு நேரம் சமமாக இருக்கும் இடத்திலும் உள்ள நட்சத்திரக்கூட்டத்தின் கூட்டமும் சமமாக நாம் விவரிக்கும் கோர்ப்ஸ் என்பது ஜெர்மன் மொழி தடுப்பு குறிப்புகளில் உள்ளது (550k குறிப்புகள்) இணைப்பில் குறிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, காமா என்பது 0. 7 என்ற Baseline experiments using BERT achieve an F1 score of 24%, showing that the task is very challenging.  ஒரு தானியங்கிய காட்சி பிரிவு நீண்ட கதைகள் அல்லது நிரல்கள் போன்ற கதைகளை செயல்படுத்துவதற்கு வழியை செயல்படுத்தும், சிறிய, கூட்டுதல் மற்றும் அர்த்தமான பகுதிகளாக முறித்து விடும். இது கணிப்பாக', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ کاغذ کاغذ لکھوں پر صحیح سقمیٹ کا نو کام معلوم کرتا ہے اور ایک اظہار کیا گیا کرپوس، کام کی زبان شناسی اور کہانیات کے خصوصے کے بارے میں بحث کرتا ہے اور آزاد خصوصے کی آزمائش اپنے ساتھ حل کی طرف۔ ایک صحیح یہاں ایک قسمت ہے جہاں زمانہ اور صحیح زمانہ زیادہ یا کم برابر ہیں، یہ صحیح ایک اقدام اور موقعیت اور اختراف ستاروں پر مشتبہ ہے۔ ہم نے جرمانی زبان کی کم رومانی (550k tokens) میں سے لکھی ہے جو مشابہ طور پر مشابہ کی گئی ہے، اور gamma = 0.7 کی بیٹی مشابہ کی موافقت پہنچ رہی ہے. BERT کے مطابق بنیاس لین کی آزمائش 24% کی F1 اسکو پہنچا رہی ہے، یہ دکھاتا ہے کہ کام بہت مشکل ہے. آٹوٹی صحیح جدائی کی طرح دور کی داستان یا رمانوں کی طرح لگانے کی طرح ان کو چھوٹے، مہمانے اور معلوم حصوں میں ٹکڑے ٹکڑے ٹکڑے کر دیتا ہے، جو کامپیوتر لیٹریری تحقیقات میں نقشه کی بازسازی کی طرف ایک اہم پتھر ہے، لیکن اس طرح مہمانی کے ذریعہ سے کاموں کو اچھا کر سکتا ہے۔', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan tugas novel segmen adegan pada teks cerita dan menyediakan corpus yang dicatat, diskusi tentang ciri-ciri bahasa dan cerita tugas dan eksperimen dasar ke arah penyelesaian automatik. Sebuah adegan di sini ialah segmen teks di mana masa dan masa pembicaraan lebih atau kurang sama, cerita fokus pada satu tindakan dan lokasi dan bintang aksara tetap sama. Korpus yang kita gambarkan terdiri dari novel dime bahasa Jerman (550k token) yang telah dicatat secara selari, mencapai perjanjian antar-annotator gamma = 0.7. Eksperimen garis asas menggunakan BERT mencapai skor F1 24%, menunjukkan tugas sangat mencabar. Segmen adegan automatik membuka jalan untuk memproses teks cerita lebih panjang seperti cerita atau novel dengan menghancurkannya ke bahagian yang lebih kecil, konsisten dan bermakna, yang merupakan batu langkah penting menuju pembangunan semula plot dalam Studi Literari Komputasi tetapi juga boleh berkhidmat untuk memperbaiki tugas seperti resolusi koreferensi.', 'uz': "Ushbu qogʻoz tashkilotni tashqi matnlarni o'zgartiradi va o'sha vazifaning lingvistik va tarixi xossalarining xossalarini va asosiy tizim bilan avtomatik imtiyozlariga qarang. Name Biz yaxshi ko'rinishimiz ko'pchilik uchun Olmon tili dim novellarga (550 km belgi) bo'ladi. Bu paytda, gamma = 0.7 bo'lgan inter-annotator heshimini olish imkoniyatini oshirish mumkin. Bu vazifa juda murakkab bo'lganligini ko'rsatadi. Name", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này giới thiệu nhiệm vụ phân chia hiện trường về các văn bản truyện và cung cấp một tập thể được ghi chú, một cuộc thảo luận về các tính chất ngôn ngữ và cốt truyện của nhiệm vụ và thí nghiệm cơ bản về các giải pháp tự động. Một cảnh ở đây là một đoạn văn bản nơi thời gian và thời gian nói chuyện gần bằng nhau, sự kể tập trung vào một hành động và địa điểm và các chòm sao ký tự vẫn như nhau. Tập thể chúng tôi miêu tả gồm tiểu thuyết rẻ tiếng Đức (bản kẽm 500k) đã được ghi âm song song song song, đạt được thỏa thuận liên niên về gamma =.0.7. Những thử nghiệm trên nền tảng được thử nghiệm qua BERT đạt được điểm F1 của 244. Cho thấy nhiệm vụ này rất khó khăn. Một phân đoạn cảnh quay tự động mở đường để xử lý các văn bản văn bản dài hơn như những câu chuyện hay tiểu thuyết bằng cách chia chúng ra thành những phần nhỏ hơn, liên quan và ý nghĩa, đó là bước tiến quan trọng để xây dựng lại các nền văn bản trong các nghiên cứu Văn học vi tính, nhưng cũng có thể giúp cải thiện các nhiệm vụ như cam go giải quyết.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя новата задача за сегментиране на сцени върху разказни текстове и предоставя анотиран корпус, дискусия на езиковите и разказативните свойства на задачата и базови експерименти към автоматични решения. Сцената тук е сегмент от текста, където времето и времето на дискурса са повече или по-малко равни, разказът се фокусира върху едно действие и местоположение и съзвездията на героите остават същите. Корпусът, който описваме, се състои от немскоезични десетични романи (550к символа), които са анотирани паралелно, постигайки междуанотаторно споразумение гама = 0,7. Базовите експерименти с BERT постигат резултат от 24%, което показва, че задачата е много предизвикателна. Автоматичната сегментация на сцената проправя пътя към обработката на по-дълги разказни текстове като приказки или романи, като ги разделя на по-малки, съгласувани и смислени части, което е важна стъпка към реконструкцията на сюжета в компютърните литературни изследвания, но също така може да послужи за подобряване на задачи като резолюция на съпровождането.', 'nl': "Dit artikel introduceert de nieuwe taak van scène segmentatie op narratieve teksten en biedt een geannoteerd corpus, een discussie over de linguïstische en narratieve eigenschappen van de taak en baseline experimenten naar automatische oplossingen. Een scène hier is een segment van de tekst waar tijd en discourstijd min of meer gelijk zijn, de vertelling focust op één actie en locatie en karakterconstellaties hetzelfde blijven. Het corpus dat we beschrijven bestaat uit Duitstalige dubbelromans (550k tokens) die parallel zijn geannoteerd, waardoor een inter-annotator overeenkomst van gamma'0.7 wordt bereikt. Baseline experimenten met BERT bereiken een F1 score van 24%, waaruit blijkt dat de taak zeer uitdagend is. Een automatische scènesegmentatie effent de weg naar het verwerken van langere verhalende teksten zoals verhalen of romans door ze op te splitsen in kleinere, coherente en betekenisvolle delen, wat een belangrijke stap is naar de reconstructie van plot in Computational Literary Studies, maar ook kan dienen om taken zoals coreference resolution te verbeteren.", 'da': 'Denne artikel introducerer den nye opgave med scenesegmentering på fortællingstekster og giver et kommenteret korpus, en diskussion af opgavens sproglige og narrative egenskaber og baseline eksperimenter mod automatiske løsninger. En scene her er et segment af teksten, hvor tid og diskurstid er mere eller mindre ens, fortællingen fokuserer på én handling og placering og karakterkonstellationer forbliver de samme. Korpusset vi beskriver består af tysksprogede dime romaner (550k tokens), der er kommenteret parallelt, hvilket opnår en inter-annotator aftale af gamma = 0,7. Baseline eksperimenter med BERT opnår en F1 score på 24%, hvilket viser, at opgaven er meget udfordrende. En automatisk scenesegmentering baner vejen for at behandle længere fortællingstekster som fortællinger eller romaner ved at nedbryde dem i mindre, sammenhængende og meningsfulde dele, hvilket er et vigtigt skridt i retning af rekonstruktion af plot i Computational Literary Studies, men også kan tjene til at forbedre opgaver som coreference resolution.', 'de': "Dieser Beitrag stellt die neuartige Aufgabe der Szenensegmentierung auf narrativen Texten vor und bietet einen annotierten Korpus, eine Diskussion der linguistischen und narrativen Eigenschaften der Aufgabe und Grundlagenexperimente hin zu automatischen Lösungen. Eine Szene ist hier ein Textabschnitt, in dem Zeit und Diskurszeit mehr oder weniger gleich sind, die Erzählung sich auf eine Handlung konzentriert und Ort und Charakterkonstellationen gleich bleiben. Der von uns beschriebene Korpus besteht aus deutschsprachigen Dime Romanen (550k Token), die parallel kommentiert wurden, wodurch eine Inter-Annotator-Vereinbarung von gamma'0.7 erreicht wurde. Baseline-Experimente mit BERT erzielen eine F1-Punktzahl von 24%, die zeigt, dass die Aufgabe sehr anspruchsvoll ist. Eine automatische Szenensegmentierung ebnet den Weg zur Verarbeitung längerer narrativer Texte wie Erzählungen oder Romane, indem sie sie in kleinere, zusammenhängende und aussagekräftige Teile zerlegt. Dies ist ein wichtiger Schritt zur Rekonstruktion von Handlung in der Computerliteraturwissenschaft, kann aber auch zur Verbesserung von Aufgaben wie der Auflösung von Coreferenz dienen.", 'ko': '본고는 서사 텍스트 장면 분할의 새로운 임무를 소개하고 주석이 있는 어료 라이브러리를 제공하여 임무의 언어와 서사 특성, 그리고 자동 해결 방안의 기선 실험을 토론했다.이곳의 장면은 텍스트의 일부분으로 시간과 말의 시간은 많든 적든 같다. 서사는 한 동작과 위치에 집중되고 캐릭터군은 변하지 않는다.우리가 묘사한 어료 라이브러리는 독일어의dime소설(550k개의 기호화폐)으로 구성되어 있으며, 이 소설들은 병행 주석되어gamma=0.7의 주석자 간의 일치성을 실현하였다.BERT를 사용한 베이스라인 실험 F1은 24%로 매우 도전적이었다.자동 장면 분할은 이야기나 소설 등 긴 서사 텍스트를 더욱 작고 일관되고 의미 있는 부분으로 분해함으로써 이를 처리하기 위해 길을 닦았다. 이것은 계산 문학 연구에서 줄거리를 재건하는 중요한 디딤돌이지만 공통 지수의 해소 등 임무를 개선하는 데도 쓰일 수 있다.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja novi zadatak segmentacije scene na priče i pruža annotiranu korpusu, raspravu o jezičkim i priče svojstvima zadatka i početnim eksperimentima prema automatskim rješenjima. Scena ovdje je dio teksta gdje vrijeme i razgovora su više ili manje jednaki, priče se fokusira na jednu akciju i lokaciju i znakove zvijezde ostaju isti. Korpus koji opisujemo sastoji se od njemačkih dimenih romana (550k znakova) koji su u paralelnom primjerenju navedeni, postižeći inter-annotatorski sporazum game = 0,7. Ispočetni eksperimenti koristeći BERT postigli su rezultat F1 od 24%, pokazujući da je zadatak vrlo izazovan. Automatična segmentacija scene otvara put ka obradu dužih priče ili romana, razdvojivajući ih u manje, saslušne i značajne dijelove, što je važan stepenik prema rekonstrukciji ploča u računalnim književnim ispitivanjima, ali također može služiti poboljšavanju zadataka poput rezolucije liječnosti.', 'id': 'This paper introduces the novel task of scene segmentation on narrative texts and provides an annotated corpus, a discussion of the linguistic and narrative properties of the task and baseline experiments towards automatic solutions.  Sebuah adegan di sini adalah segmen teks di mana waktu dan waktu diskors lebih atau kurang sama, cerita fokus pada satu aksi dan lokasi dan bintang karakter tetap sama. Korpus yang kita deskripsikan terdiri dari novel dime bahasa Jerman (550k token) yang telah dicatat secara paralel, mencapai kesepakatan inter annotator gamma = 0,7. Eksperimen dasar menggunakan BERT mencapai skor F1 24%, menunjukkan bahwa tugasnya sangat menantang. Sebuah segmentasi adegan otomatis membuka jalan untuk memproses teks narratif yang lebih panjang seperti cerita atau novel dengan menghancurkannya ke bagian yang lebih kecil, konsisten dan berarti, yang merupakan batu langkah penting menuju rekonstruksi plot dalam Studi Literari Komputasional tetapi juga dapat melayani untuk meningkatkan tugas seperti resolusi koreferensi.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ، وظیفه رمانی از جدایی صحنه بر متن های داستان را معرفی می کند و یک کورپوس مشخص می کند، یک بحث از ویژه های زبان\u200cشناسی و داستان\u200cشناسی کار و آزمایش\u200cهای بنیادی به سوی راه حل\u200cهای خودکار. یک صحنه اینجا بخش متن است که زمان و گفتگو بیشتر یا کمتر برابر هستند، داستان بر یک حرکت و محل و ستاره\u200cهای شخصیت تمرکز می\u200cکند. کورپوس که توصیف می\u200cکنیم، از روزنامه\u200cهای کم زبان آلمانی (550k tokens) است که با مشابه مشابه شده\u200cاند، با رسیدن توافق بین\u200cمشابه\u200cکننده\u200cای از گاما = 0.7. آزمایشات بنیادی با استفاده از BERT یک امتیاز F1 در ۲۴ درصد رسیده است که نشان می دهد که این کار بسیار سخت است. یک بخش صحنه اتوماتیک راه به پرداخت متن داستان\u200cهای بیشتری مانند داستان\u200cها یا رمانها را با شکستن آن\u200cها به بخش\u200cهای کوچک، هماهنگ و معنی\u200cای قرار می\u200cدهد، که یک سنگ قدم\u200cگذاری مهم به سوی بازسازی نقشه\u200cها در مطالعه\u200cهای کتاب\u200cنویسی کامپیوتری است، ولی می\u200cتواند کار\u200cهای مانند راه\u200cگذاری\u200c', 'af': "Hierdie papier introduseer die romaniese taak van scene segmentasie op narratiewe teks en verskaf 'n notateerde korpus, 'n diskusie van die lingwisiese en narratiewe eienskappe van die taak en basisline eksperimente na outomatiese oplossing. 'n Scene hier is 'n segment van die teks waar tyd en diskursie tyd is meer of minder gelyk, die verklaring fokus op een aksie en ligging en karakter stellings dieselfde bly. Die korpus wat ons beskryf is bestaan van Duits-taal dime novele (550k tokens) wat in parallele aangeteken is, met 'n inter-annotator ooreenkoms van gamma = 0.7. Basisline eksperimente gebruik BERT bereik 'n F1 punt van 24%, wat vertoon dat die taak baie moeilik is. 'n Outomatiese scene segmentasie plaas die pad na verwerking van langer narratiewe teks soos tale of novele deur hulle afbreek in kleinere, koerende en betekende dele, wat is 'n belangrike stap klip teenoor die herkonstruksie van plot in Rekenasiese Literary Studies, maar ook kan dien om opdragte soos koreferensie oplossing te verbeter.", 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaonyesha jukumu la riwaya la kutengeneza maeneo yanayohusu maandishi ya simulizi na inatoa makampuni yenye kuchanganyikiwa, mjadala wa utaalamu wa lugha na simulizi za kazi na majaribio ya msingi kwa ajili ya ufumbuzi wa kujitegemea. Tovuti hapa ni sehemu ya maandishi ambapo muda na wakati wa mazungumzo ni sawa au chini ya usawa, simulizi hizo zinajikita kwenye hatua moja na sehemu moja na nyota za wahusika ziko sawa. Makampuni tunayoyaelezea ni pamoja na riwaya yenye madhubuti ya lugha ya Kijerumani (ishara 550 km) ambazo zimekuwa zinakasirishwa kwa kulinganisha, kutekeleza makubaliano ya kukabiliana na gamma = 0.7. Majaribio ya msingi kwa kutumia BERT yanafanikiwa score ya F1 kwa asilimia 24, ikionyesha kwamba kazi hiyo ni changamoto sana. Mgawanyo wa eneo la kujitegemea unazuia njia ya kuendeleza maandishi ya simulizi za muda mrefu kama simulizi au riwaya kwa kuvunja kwa sehemu ndogo, yenye ushirikiano na yenye maana, ambayo ni hatua muhimu kwa ajili ya kujenga mpango katika tafiti za Fasihi za Kihisabu lakini pia inaweza kutumika ili kuboresha kazi kama suluhisho la msingi.', 'sq': 'This paper introduces the novel task of scene segmentation on narrative texts and provides an annotated corpus, a discussion of the linguistic and narrative properties of the task and baseline experiments towards automatic solutions.  Një skenë këtu është një segment i tekstit ku koha dhe koha e diskursit janë më pak ose më pak të barabartë, tregimi përqëndrohet në një veprim dhe vendndodhje dhe konstelacionet e karakterit mbeten të njëjtë. Korpus që ne e përshkruajmë përbëhet nga romane të dhjeta në gjuhën gjermane (550k token) që janë shënuar në paralel, duke arritur një marrëveshje ndër-shënuare gamma = 0.7. Eksperimentet bazë duke përdorur BERT arrijnë një rezultat F1 prej 24%, duke treguar se detyra është shumë e vështirë. Një segmentim automatik skene hap rrugën drejt procesimit të teksteve më të gjata treguese si tregime apo romane duke i ndarë ato në pjesë më të vogla, koherente dhe të kuptueshme, e cila është një gur hapi i rëndësishëm drejt rindërtimit të komplotit në Studimet Literatare Komputative por gjithashtu mund të shërbejë për përmirësimin e detyrave si zgjidhja e korreferencës.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ በተርታ ጽሑፎች ላይ የደረጃ ክፍተቶችን የሚያሳየው የአሁኑን ጉዳይ እና የስራውን የቋንቋዊ እና የዝርዝር ምርጫዎች እና የመደበኛ ፈተና ለራሳቸው ማቀናቀል የሚያስፈልገውን አዋጅ ያሳያል፡፡ የጽሑፉ ቁጥር፣ ሰዓት እና ንግግር ሰዓት ብዛት ወይም ትንሹ የሚሆን የጽሑፍ ክፍል ነው፡፡ የምንለውን ኮርፓስ የጀርመን ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ አቋራጭ (550 ሺሕ ምልክቶች) በተቃራኒ እና ጋማ = 0.7 በተመሳሳይ ተቃውሞ አግኝቷል፡፡ BERT በመጠቀም የመሠረት ፈተና 24 በመቶ የF1 score እንዲያገኙ ነው፡፡ An automatic scene segmentation paves the way towards processing longer narrative texts like tales or novels by breaking them down into smaller, coherent and meaningful parts, which is an important stepping stone towards the reconstruction of plot in Computational Literary Studies but also can serve to improve tasks like coreference resolution.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz hekaýat metinler hakynda sahne segmentasyonuň täze zadyny tanyşýar we şöyle bir korpus, zadyň lingwistiki we hekaýat özelliklerini we awtomatik çözümlere görkezilýän çözümlerini saýlaýar. Bu ýerde metin bir bölegidir. Zaman we diskrimiň wagty bireme ýa-da kiçi bir deňdir, sözleşişi bir eylem we ýere we karakter ýyldyzlarynda durýar. Biziň tassyýandyrýan korpus, gamma = 0.7 aralygyna golaýlaşýan alemdan bäş romanlaryň (550k tokens) bardyr. BERT'i ulanylan temel deneyler F1 depesini 24%-den ýetip biler, bu zadyň örän kynçylykdygyny görkez. Otomatik sahne segmentasy, olary kiçijek, hereket we wajyplyk böleklere ýokary uly hekaýatlar ýaly aýdyşy ýaly aýdyşy şeklinde işlemek üçin ýöredir. Bu iş Kompýuter Literary Studies ýüzerinde çizginiň ýene-töremegine mühüm ýetişdirilip taý diýip başarmak üçin ýöredir.", 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է պատմությունների տեքստների մասին տեսարանի սեգրամացիայի նոր խնդիրը և պարունակում է նշումնավորված կորպուս, քննարկում խնդրի լեզվական և պատմությունների առանձնահատկությունների մասին և հիմնական փորձեր ավտոմատիկ լուծումների համար: Սցենն այստեղ տեքստի մի մասն է, որտեղ ժամանակը և քննարկումների ժամանակը ավելի կամ ավելի հավասար են, պատմությունը կենտրոնանում է մեկ գործողության վրա, տեղադրության վրա, և բնավորական աստղադիրքերը միևնույն են: The corpus we describe consists of German-language dime novels (550k tokens) that have been annotated in parallel, achieving an inter-annotator agreement of gamma = 0.7.  ԲԵՌԹ-ի օգտագործման հիմնական փորձարկումները հասնում են F1-ի 24 տոկոսին, որը ցույց է տալիս, որ խնդիրը շատ դժվար է: Ավտոմատիկ բնապատկերի սեգմետրացիան պատրաստում է ճանապարհ ավելի երկար պատմությունների, ինչպիսիք են պատմությունները կամ վեպերը, բաժանելով դրանք ավելի փոքր, համապատասխանատու և իմաստալից մասերի, ինչը կարևոր քայլ է քայլ դեպի կառուցվածքի վերականգնումը համակարգչային գրական ուսումնասիրություններում, բայց կարող է նաև օգնել', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja novi zadatak segmentacije scene na priče i pruža annotiranu korpusu, diskusiju o jezičkim i priče svojstvima zadatka i početnim eksperimentima prema automatskim rješenjima. Scena ovdje je segment teksta gdje vrijeme i razgovor su više ili manje jednaki, priče se fokusira na jednu akciju i lokaciju i karakterne zvijezde ostaju iste. Korpus koji opisujemo se sastoji od njemačkih dimenih romana (550k znakova) koji su paralelno annotirani, ostvarivši inter-annotatorski sporazum game = 0,7. Ispočetni eksperimenti koristeći BERT postigli su rezultat F1 od 24%, pokazujući da je zadatak veoma izazovan. Automatična segmentacija scene pokriva put ka obradu dužih priče ili romana, razdvojivajući ih u manje, saslušne i značajne dijelove, što je važan stepenik prema rekonstrukciji ploča u računalnim književnim studijama, ali također može služiti poboljšavanju zadataka kao što je rezolucija pristojnosti.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt məktublar haqqında sahne segmentasiyasının yeni görevini təşkil edir və bu işin dil və hekayətlərin təşkillərini avtomatik çətinliklərə təşkil edir. Buradakı bir sahədə, vaxt və söhbət vaxtı daha çox ya da az eşit olan mətnin bir parçasıdır, söhbət bir eyni eyni eyni eyni eyni halda qalar. Bizim tanımadığımız korpus alman dilində dimi romanlardan olub, gamma = 0.7 arasındakı annotator anlaşmasına çatdırılır. BERT vasitəsilə istifadə edilən təcrübələr 24%-dən f1 dəqiqəsini qəbul edir, işin çox çətin olduğunu göstərir. Avtomatik sahələr segmentasiyası, daha uzun hekayələr və romanlar kimi yazılar ilə işləmək üçün yolu göstərir, onları kiçik, coherent və anlamlı parçalara bölüşdürərək, ki bu, Computational Literary Studies məlumatlarında planların yenidən in şa edilməsinə çox möhüm bir dəstək taşı, lakin həmçin in mərhəmət çətinlikləri kimi işləri daha yaxşılaşdırmağa çalış', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje novou úlohu segmentace scén na narativních textech a poskytuje anotovaný korpus, diskusi lingvistických a narativních vlastností úlohy a základní experimenty směrem k automatickému řešení. Scéna zde je segment textu, kde čas a diskurzní čas jsou více či méně rovné, vyprávění se zaměřuje na jednu akci a místo a souhvězdí postav zůstávají stejné. Korpus, který popisujeme, se skládá z německy-jazyčných desetiletových románů (550k tokenů), které byly paralelně anotovány a dosaženy interanotátorové dohody gamma-0,7. Základní experimenty s využitím BERT dosahují F1 skóre 24%, ukazující, že úkol je velmi náročný. Automatická segmentace scén připravuje cestu ke zpracování delších vyprávěcích textů, jako jsou příběhy nebo romány tím, že je rozdělena na menší, koherentní a smysluplné části, což je důležitým odrazovým kamenem k rekonstrukci děje v oblasti výpočetních literárních studií, ale také může sloužit ke zlepšení úkolů, jako je řešení koreferencí.', 'et': 'Käesolev töö tutvustab narratiivsete tekstide stseenide segmenteerimise uudset ülesannet ning annab märgitud korpuse, ülesande keeleliste ja narratiivsete omaduste arutelu ning automaatsete lahenduste suunas tehtavate lähteeksperimentide. Stseen siin on teksti segment, kus aeg ja diskursuaeg on enam-vähem võrdsed, jutustus keskendub ühele tegevusele ja asukohale ning tegelaste tähtkujud jäävad samaks. Kirjeldatud korpus koosneb saksakeelsetest dimeroonidest (550k märki), mis on paralleelselt anoteeritud, saavutades anotatoritevahelise kokkuleppe gamma = 0,7. BERT-i kasutavate esialgsete katsete tulemusel saavutatakse F1 skoor 24%, mis näitab, et ülesanne on väga keeruline. Automaatne stseeni segmenteerimine sillutab teed pikemate narratiivsete tekstide, näiteks lugude või romaanide töötlemisele, jagades need väiksemateks, sidusateks ja tähendusrikkateks osadeks, mis on oluline samm graafiku rekonstrueerimisel arvutuslikus kirjandusuuringus, kuid võib aidata parandada ka selliseid ülesandeid nagu ühiskondlik resolutsioon.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি স্বয়ংক্রিয় সমাধানের জন্য ভাষাগত এবং বেসালাইন পরীক্ষার বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্য নিয়ে দৃশ্য বিভিন্ন পরীক্ষার উপস্থাপন করে এবং স্বয়ংক্রিয় এখানে একটি দৃশ্য হলো টেক্সটের একটি অংশ যেখানে সময় এবং কথোপকথনের সময় সমতুল্য, বর্ণনা একটি কাজ এবং অবস্থান এবং অক্ষরের তারামণ্ডল একই রকম থাকে। আমরা যে কোর্পাসের বর্ণনা করছি তার মধ্যে জার্মান ভাষার ধ্বংসস্থান (৫৫০ হাজার চিহ্ন) যারা তাদের প্যারালেলে বিরক্তিকর, গ্যামার মধ্যে বিভিন্ন বেরেট ব্যবহার করে বেলিনাল পরীক্ষার মূল পরীক্ষা ২৪ শতাংশের একটি F1 স্কোর অর্জন করে, যেখানে দেখা যাচ্ছে যে কাজ খুব চ একটি স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে দৃশ্য বিভাগের মাধ্যমে গল্প অথবা উপন্যাসের মতো দীর্ঘ বর্তমান লেখা প্রক্রিয়ার পথ প্রকাশ করে তাদের ছোট, সামান্য এবং অর্থহীন অংশে ভেঙ্গে ফেলে, যা কম্পিউটাশনাল সাহিত্য স্', 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli esittelee narratiivisen tekstin kohtaussegmentoinnin uutta tehtävää ja tarjoaa kommentoidun korpusen, keskustelun tehtävän kielellisistä ja narratiivisista ominaisuuksista sekä lähtötilanteen kokeiluja kohti automaattisia ratkaisuja. Kohtaus tässä on tekstin segmentti, jossa aika ja diskurssiaika ovat enemmän tai vähemmän tasa-arvoisia, kertomus keskittyy yhteen toimintaan ja paikkaan ja hahmojen tähdistöt pysyvät samoina. Kuvaamamme korpus koostuu saksankielisistä dime-romaaneista (550k merkkiä), jotka on merkitty rinnakkain, saavuttaen huomautusten välisen sopimuksen gamma = 0,7. BERT-testit saavuttavat F1-pisteen 24%, mikä osoittaa, että tehtävä on hyvin haastava. Automaattinen kohtaussegmentointi tasoittaa tietä pidempien kertomusten, kuten tarinoiden tai romaanien, käsittelyyn jakamalla ne pienempiin, johdonmukaisiin ja merkityksellisiin osiin, mikä on tärkeä askel juonen rekonstruktiossa laskennallisessa kirjallisuustutkimuksessa, mutta voi myös auttaa parantamaan tehtäviä, kuten yhteisferenssin resoluutiota.', 'ca': "Aquest article introdueix la nova tasca de segmentació de l'escena en textos narratius i proporciona un corpus anotat, una discussió sobre les propietats lingüístices i narratives de la tasca i els experiments de base cap a solucions automàtiques. Una escena aquí és un segment del text on el temps i el temps del discurs són més o menys iguals, la narració es centra en una acció i la localització i les constelacions de caràcter permaneixen iguals. El corpus que descrivim consisteix en novels de dime en alemanya (550k fitxes) que han estat anotats en paral·lel, aconseguint un acord entre anotators de gamma = 0,7. Els experiments de base amb BERT aconsegueixen una puntuació F1 del 24%, mostrant que la tasca és molt difícil. Una segmentació automàtica obre el camí cap al processament de textos narrativs més llargs com contes o novels en parts més petites, coherents i significatives, que és una important etapa cap a la reconstrucció del tram en Estudios Literatius Computatius, però també pot servir per millorar tasques com la resolució de coreferencia.", 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljena nova naloga segmentacije scen na pripovednih besedilih in zagotovljen korpus z opombami, razprava o jezikovnih in pripovednih lastnostih naloge ter osnovni eksperimenti v smeri avtomatičnih rešitev. Prizor je segment besedila, kjer sta čas in čas diskurza bolj ali manj enaka, pripoved se osredotoča na eno dejanje in lokacijo, ozvezdja znakov pa ostanejo enaka. Korpus, ki ga opisujemo, je sestavljen iz nemškega jezika dime romanov (550k žetonov), ki so bili vzporedno označeni, s čimer je dosežen medoznačevalni dogovor gama = 0,7. Izhodiščni poskusi z BERT dosežejo rezultat F1 24%, kar kaže, da je naloga zelo zahtevna. Avtomatska segmentacija scene utrjuje pot k obdelavi daljših pripovednih besedil, kot so zgodbe ali romani, tako da jih razdeli na manjše, koherentne in smiselne dele, kar je pomemben korak k rekonstrukciji ploskve v računalniških literarnih študijah, lahko pa tudi služi za izboljšanje nalog, kot je reševanje koreference.', 'jv': 'Gambar iki dadi nggawe barang kelas perusahaan anyar tentang karo nggawe kno dadi, nggawe barang langkung karo nggawe perusahaan anyar nggawe nguasakno karo nggawe gerakan karo perusahaan sing bakal terus tambah nggawe nguasakno string" in "context_BAR_string Cep sing dipun ngomong karo perusahaan langgambar denguluh kuwi anu-perusahaan (500 token) sing ditambah dumaten, sanes kapan inter-annatar seneng gawe gamma = 0.7. Ndoleh sing paling-paling nggambar BERT kuwi nggawe puntuan F1 kang 24%, dadi kapan dadi kaé nggunakake sing apik tenan. segmentation', 'he': 'This paper introduces the novel task of scene segmentation on narrative texts and provides an annotated corpus, a discussion of the linguistic and narrative properties of the task and baseline experiments towards automatic solutions.  סצנה כאן היא חלק מהטקסט שבו הזמן והזמן של דיבור שווים פחות או יותר, הסיפור מתמקד בפעולה אחת ומיקום וכוכבי האופים נשארים אותו הדבר. הקורפוס שאנחנו מתארים מורכב מרומנים בשפה גרמנית (550 אלף סימנים) שציונים במקביל, להשיג הסכם בין ציונים של גמה = 0.7. ניסויים בסיסיים באמצעות BERT להשיג נקודת F1 של 24%, מראה שהמשימה מאד מאתגרת. סצנה אוטומטית מפנה את הדרך לעבוד טקסטים סיפורים ארוכים יותר, כמו סיפורים או רומנים, על ידי פיצוץ אותם לחלקים קטנים, koherenטים וממשמעותיים, שהוא אבן צעד חשוב לכיוון שיחזור של תכנית במחקרים ספרתיים מחשבים, אך גם יכול לשפע לשפר משימות כמו פיתרון קומפרנס.', 'ha': "Wannan takardar na ƙara aikin kwanan da aka nuna sigarin kwanan cikin littafan lãbãri kuma yana samar da wata nau'in da aka sanar da shi, a kan jayayya masu cikin linguistic da bakin lãbãri na aikin da aka sami jarraba masu buƙata farat ɗaya. Wannan wani fili ne da wani rabon matsayin, inda lokaci da mazaɓa da magana sun fi daidai, kuma kiyayen ɗin na zura ido kan aiki guda da wurin da taurãri cikin rubutu sun yi daidai. Corbas da Muke bayyana shi na kamfata cikin hanyoyin jeruman (alamomin 550 km) wanda aka yi cũtar da shi a parallel, da gaskata wata yardar-inter-sanatarwa na gama=0.7. Baseline experiments using BERT achieve an F1 score of 24%, showing that the task is very challenging.  Tsarawa na farat ɗaya na hanci zuwa masu aiki da takardar faɗi masu ƙaranci kamar kunnufi ko riwaya, da kuma ya jefa su zuwa rabo ƙarami, da kuma masu hankali, wanda ya kasance na muhimu da kuskure zuwa rekodin littafin da lissafi na lissafa, kuma amma yana iya iya amfani da su kyautata aikin su kamar rabon sarrafiya.", 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་སྐྱེས་པའི་ཚིག A scene here is a segment of the text where time and discourse time are more or less equal, the narration focuses on one action and location and character constellations stay the same. The corpus we describe consists of German-language dime novels (550k tokens) that have been annotated in parallel, achieving an inter-annotator agreement of gamma = 0.7. BERT སྤྱད་ནས་གཞི་གཞི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གིས་མཇུག་བསྡུ་ཡོད་པའི་ཚད་ལྟར་ཉུང་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལྟར་ཉེན་བརྟན་ན། ལས་ཀ་ནི་གནད་ད An automatic scene segmentation paves the way towards processing longer narrative texts like tales or novels by breaking them down in to smaller, coherent and meaningful parts, which is an important stepping stone towards the reconstruction of plot in Computational Literary Studies but also can serve to improve tasks like coreference resolution.'}
{'en': 'Expanding, Retrieving and Infilling : Diversifying Cross-Domain Question Generation with Flexible Templates', 'ar': 'التوسيع والاسترداد والملء: تنويع إنشاء الأسئلة عبر المجالات باستخدام قوالب مرنة', 'fr': 'Expansion, récupération et remplissage\xa0: diversifier la génération de questions interdomaines grâce à des modèles flexibles', 'pt': 'Expansão, recuperação e preenchimento: diversificando a geração de perguntas entre domínios com modelos flexíveis', 'es': 'Expansión, recuperación y llenado: diversificación de la generación de preguntas entre dominios con plantillas flexibles', 'ja': '拡張、取得、および充填：柔軟なテンプレートを使用したクロスドメイン質問生成の多様化', 'zh': '广检充塞:以生模板生跨域多样化', 'ru': 'Расширение, извлечение и заполнение: диверсификация генерации междоменных вопросов с помощью гибких шаблонов', 'hi': 'विस्तार, पुनर्प्राप्ति और Infilling: लचीला टेम्पलेट्स के साथ क्रॉस-डोमेन प्रश्न जनरेशन में विविधता लाना', 'ga': 'M챕ad첬, Aisghabh찼il agus Inl챠onadh: Gini첬int Ceisteanna Trasfhearann a 횋ags첬l첬 le Teimpl챕id Shol첬btha', 'ka': 'პარამეტრება, მიღება და ინფლინტირება: დივარიფიზაცია კრესომენის კითხვების შექმნა Flexible Templates- ით', 'el': 'Επέκταση, ανάκτηση και συμπλήρωση: Διαφοροποίηση της δημιουργίας ερωτημάτων μεταξύ τομέων με ευέλικτα πρότυπα', 'hu': 'Bővítés, lekérdezés és befolyásolás: A tartományok közötti kérdések sokszínűsítése rugalmas sablonokkal', 'it': 'Espandere, recuperare e inserire: diversificare la generazione di domande tra domini con modelli flessibili', 'kk': 'Кеңейту, алу және түсіру: Қос- домендің сұрақтарын бірнеше түрлендіру - Flexible үлгілерімен құру', 'ms': 'Expanding, Retrieving and Infilling: Diversifying Cross-Domain Question Generation with Flexible Templates', 'lt': 'Išplėtimas, gavimas ir pažeidimas: įvairių sričių klausimų generacija su lanksčiais modeliais', 'ml': 'വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്നു, വീണ്ടും തിരിച്ചുവരുത്തുന്നു: ക്രോസ്- ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ചോദ്യം പ്രവർത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന വിഭ', 'mn': 'Өгөрөх, авч авах болон буулгах: Diversifying Cross-Domain Question Generation with Flexible Templates', 'mk': 'Раширување, преземање и попуштање: различна генерација на прашања во меѓудомените со флексибилни шаблони', 'pl': 'Rozszerzanie, pobieranie i uzupełnianie: Zróżnicowanie generowania pytań między domenami za pomocą elastycznych szablonów', 'mt': 'L-espansjoni, il-kisba u l-infjammazzjoni: Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Mistoqsijiet Transdomestiċi Diversifikanti b’Mudelli Flessibbli', 'ro': 'Extinderea, recuperarea și introducerea: Diversificarea generării de întrebări între domenii cu șabloane flexibile', 'no': 'Utvid, hent og sletting: Diversifiserer krysdomenespørsmål med fleksibel mal', 'so': "Baritaanka, soo qaadashada iyo buuxinta: Divideysiga su'aalaha iskuulka-Domain Generation with Flexible Templates", 'ta': 'விரிவாக்கப்படுகிறது, திரும்ப பெறுதல் மற்றும் நிரப்புதல்: கிருஸ்- டோமைன் கேள்வி உருவாக்கத்தை வெளியேறும் வார', 'sv': 'Expandera, hämta och fylla i: Diversifiera generering av frågor över domäner med flexibla mallar', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'پھیلانے، پھیلانے اور انفالینگ: مختلف کروس دامین سوال جوڑنے کے ساتھ فلکسیبل ٹیپلٹ کے ساتھ مختلف', 'sr': 'Proširenje, otkupljanje i upaljenje: raznovrsavanje generacije krstodomena pitanja sa fleksibilnim šablonama', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Mở rộng, phục hồi và Liên Kết:', 'bg': 'Разширяване, извличане и попълване: диверсифициране на генерирането на въпроси между домейните с гъвкави шаблони', 'nl': 'Uitbreiden, ophalen en vullen: het genereren van domeinoverschrijdende vragen diversifiëren met flexibele sjablonen', 'da': 'Udvidelse, hentning og indførelse: Diversificering af generering af spørgsmål på tværs af domæner med fleksible skabeloner', 'id': 'Pembesaran, Penerimaan dan Penyerangan: Pemberagaman Pertanyaan Salib Domain dengan Templat Fleksibel', 'hr': 'Proširenje, prikupljanje i potpunjenje: raznovrsavanje krstodomena pitanja s fleksibilnim šablonama', 'ko': '확장, 검색 및 채우기: 유연한 템플릿을 사용하여 다양한 분야의 문제 생성', 'de': 'Erweitern, Abrufen und Füllen: Bereichsübergreifende Fragegenerierung mit flexiblen Vorlagen diversifizieren', 'fa': 'گسترش، بازیابی و تحویل: تولید سوال\u200cهای عبارت دامنه با نمونه\u200cهای متفاوتی', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Zgjerimi, marrja dhe ngatërrimi: Gjenerimi i pyetjeve të ndryshme ndërdomenale me modele fleksible', 'sw': 'Kueneza, Kurudishwa na Kujali: Kutofautiana na swali la Kusini-Domen kwa ajili ya Miundo ya Kuhamia', 'tr': 'Çeşitmek, Ululmak we Infilleme: Flexible Şablonlar bilen Çeşitmek Orta-Domain Soragy Generasy', 'am': 'ምስሉን በሌላ ስም አስቀምጥ', 'az': 'V…ôzifl…ôm…ô, AlńĪŇüma v…ô ńįŇül…ôm…ô: Fleksible Ňěablonlar il…ô √áiftl…ôŇüdiril…ôn X…ôrc Domain SoruŇüu Yenilm…ôsi', 'bn': 'প্রস্থান, পুনরুদ্ধার এবং পুনরুদ্ধার করা হচ্ছে: ক্রস- ডোমেইন প্রশ্নের জেনারেশন ফ্ল্যাম্পেলের সাথে আলাদা করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Proširenje, otkupljanje i upaljanje: Diversiviranje generacije krstodomena pitanja sa fleksibilnim šablonama', 'cs': 'Rozšiřování, získávání a doplňování: Diverzifikace generování otázek mezi různými doménami pomocí flexibilních šablon', 'et': 'Laiendamine, hankimine ja täitmine: domeenidevaheliste küsimuste genereerimise mitmekesistamine paindlike mallidega', 'ca': 'Ampliar, recuperar i influir: generació de preguntes transdomíniques diversificada amb models flexibles', 'fi': 'Laajentaminen, nouto ja täyttäminen: Monipuolista verkkotunnusten välistä kyselyä joustavilla malleilla', 'hy': 'Մեծացնել, վերցնել և ներխուժել. բազմազան միջբևեռի հարցեր ստեղծելու համար ճկուն մոդելներով', 'jv': 'Expanding, Rejecting and Infoilling: Multirsify Kr-domain question Generation with Floksible template', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'התרחבות, השיגור והפגיעה: מיוצר שאלות מגוונות בין שדות', 'sk': 'Razširitev, pridobivanje in polnjenje: raznolikost ustvarjanja vprašanj med domenami s prilagodljivimi predlogami', 'bo': 'Expanding, Retrieving and Infilling: Diversifying Cross-Domain Question Generation with Flexible Templates'}
{'en': 'Sequence-to-sequence based models have recently shown promising results in generating high-quality questions. However, these models are also known to have main drawbacks such as lack of diversity and bad sentence structures. In this paper, we focus on question generation over SQL database and propose a novel framework by expanding, retrieving, and infilling that first incorporates flexible templates with a neural-based model to generate diverse expressions of questions with sentence structure guidance. Furthermore, a new activation / deactivation mechanism is proposed for template-based sequence-to-sequence generation, which learns to discriminate template patterns and content patterns, thus further improves generation quality. We conduct experiments on two large-scale cross-domain datasets. The experiments show that the superiority of our question generation method in producing more diverse questions while maintaining high quality and consistency under both automatic evaluation and human evaluation.', 'fr': "Les modèles de séquence à séquence ont récemment donné des résultats prometteurs en matière de génération de questions de haute qualité. Cependant, ces modèles sont également connus pour présenter des inconvénients majeurs tels que le manque de diversité et de mauvaises structures de phrases. Dans cet article, nous nous concentrons sur la génération de questions par rapport à une base de données SQL et proposons un nouveau cadre de développement, de récupération et de remplissage qui intègre d'abord des modèles flexibles avec un modèle basé sur les neurones pour générer diverses expressions de questions avec guidage de la structure des phrases. En outre, un nouveau mécanisme d'activation/désactivation est proposé pour la génération séquence-séquence basée sur un modèle, qui apprend à discriminer des modèles de modèles et des modèles de contenu, améliorant ainsi encore la qualité de génération. Nous menons des expériences sur deux ensembles de données interdomaines à grande échelle. Les expériences montrent que la supériorité de notre méthode de génération de questions permet de produire des questions plus diverses tout en maintenant une qualité et une cohérence élevées à la fois dans le cadre de l'évaluation automatique et de l'évaluation humaine.", 'ar': 'أظهرت النماذج القائمة على التسلسل إلى التسلسل مؤخرًا نتائج واعدة في توليد أسئلة عالية الجودة. ومع ذلك ، من المعروف أيضًا أن هذه النماذج لها عيوب رئيسية مثل نقص التنوع وهياكل الجمل السيئة. في هذه الورقة ، نركز على توليد الأسئلة عبر قاعدة بيانات SQL ونقترح إطارًا جديدًا من خلال التوسع والاسترجاع والحشو الذي يدمج أولاً قوالب مرنة مع نموذج قائم على العصب لتوليد تعبيرات متنوعة للأسئلة مع توجيه بنية الجملة. علاوة على ذلك ، تم اقتراح آلية تنشيط / إلغاء تنشيط جديدة لتوليد التسلسل إلى التسلسل المستند إلى القالب ، والذي يتعلم التمييز بين أنماط النماذج وأنماط المحتوى ، وبالتالي تحسين جودة التوليد. نجري تجارب على مجموعتي بيانات واسعتي النطاق عبر المجالات. أظهرت التجارب تفوق أسلوب طرح الأسئلة في إنتاج أسئلة أكثر تنوعًا مع الحفاظ على الجودة العالية والاتساق في ظل كل من التقييم التلقائي والتقييم البشري.', 'es': 'Los modelos basados en secuencia a secuencia han mostrado recientemente resultados prometedores en la generación de preguntas de alta calidad. Sin embargo, también se sabe que estos modelos tienen principales inconvenientes, como la falta de diversidad y las malas estructuras de sentencia. En este artículo, nos centramos en la generación de preguntas sobre la base de datos SQL y proponemos un marco novedoso mediante la expansión, la recuperación y el llenado que primero incorpora plantillas flexibles con un modelo neuronal para generar diversas expresiones de preguntas con orientación sobre la estructura de las oraciones. Además, se propone un nuevo mecanismo de activación/desactivación para la generación de secuencia a secuencia basada en plantillas, que aprende a discriminar patrones de plantillas y patrones de contenido, mejorando así aún más la calidad de generación. Llevamos a cabo experimentos en dos conjuntos de datos multidominio a gran escala. Los experimentos muestran la superioridad de nuestro método de generación de preguntas para producir preguntas más diversas, manteniendo una alta calidad y coherencia tanto en la evaluación automática como en la evaluación humana.', 'pt': 'Modelos baseados em sequência a sequência mostraram recentemente resultados promissores na geração de perguntas de alta qualidade. No entanto, esses modelos também são conhecidos por terem principais desvantagens, como falta de diversidade e estruturas de frases ruins. Neste artigo, nos concentramos na geração de perguntas sobre o banco de dados SQL e propomos uma nova estrutura, expandindo, recuperando e preenchendo, que primeiro incorpora modelos flexíveis com um modelo baseado em neurônios para gerar diversas expressões de perguntas com orientação de estrutura de sentença. Além disso, um novo mecanismo de ativação/desativação é proposto para geração de sequência a sequência baseada em template, que aprende a discriminar padrões de template e padrões de conteúdo, melhorando ainda mais a qualidade da geração. Realizamos experimentos em dois conjuntos de dados de domínio cruzado de grande escala. Os experimentos mostram a superioridade do nosso método de geração de perguntas em produzir perguntas mais diversas, mantendo alta qualidade e consistência tanto na avaliação automática quanto na avaliação humana.', 'ja': 'シーケンスツーシーケンスベースモデルは、質の高い質問を生成する上で最近有望な結果を示しています。 しかし、これらのモデルには、多様性の欠如や悪い文章構造などの主な欠点もあることが知られています。 本稿では， SQLデータベース上での質問生成に焦点を当て，まずはニューラルベースのモデルでフレキシブルテンプレートを組み込み，文章構造のガイダンスで多様な質問表現を生成することで，新たな枠組みを提案する． さらに、テンプレートベースのシーケンス間生成のための新しい活性化／非活性化メカニズムが提案されており、これは、テンプレートパターン及びコンテンツパターンを識別することを学び、したがって、生成品質をさらに向上させる。 2つの大規模なクロスドメインデータセットの実験を行っています。 実験は、自動評価と人間による評価の両方の下で高品質と一貫性を維持しながら、より多様な質問を生成する当社の質問生成方法の優位性を示しています。', 'hi': 'अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम आधारित मॉडल ने हाल ही में उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले प्रश्नों को उत्पन्न करने में आशाजनक परिणाम दिखाए हैं। हालांकि, इन मॉडलों को विविधता की कमी और खराब वाक्य संरचनाओं जैसी मुख्य कमियों के लिए भी जाना जाता है। इस पेपर में, हम एसक्यूएल डेटाबेस पर प्रश्न पीढ़ी पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं और विस्तार, पुनः प्राप्त करने और भरने के द्वारा एक उपन्यास ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो पहले वाक्य संरचना मार्गदर्शन के साथ प्रश्नों की विविध अभिव्यक्तियों को उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक तंत्रिका-आधारित मॉडल के साथ लचीले टेम्पलेट्स को शामिल करता है। इसके अलावा, टेम्पलेट-आधारित अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम पीढ़ी के लिए एक नया सक्रियण / निष्क्रियता तंत्र प्रस्तावित किया गया है, जो टेम्पलेट पैटर्न और सामग्री पैटर्न में भेदभाव करना सीखता है, इस प्रकार पीढ़ी की गुणवत्ता में और सुधार करता है। हम दो बड़े पैमाने पर क्रॉस-डोमेन डेटासेट पर प्रयोग करते हैं। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि स्वचालित मूल्यांकन और मानव मूल्यांकन दोनों के तहत उच्च गुणवत्ता और स्थिरता बनाए रखते हुए अधिक विविध प्रश्नों का उत्पादन करने में हमारी प्रश्न पीढ़ी विधि की श्रेष्ठता।', 'zh': '盖序之近成高质量见有愿也。 然众所周知,亦有大体,如乏多样性与糟粕之句结构。 夫文者,专于SQL数据库而广之,检而充之,框架先合模板于神经,以结句成事。 模板序成,新激活/停机,学分模板式,进一步提高生成质。 二大跨域数集上实验。 实验自料与人工评之,吾道生更多样性,高质量一致性有优越性。', 'ru': 'Модели, основанные на последовательности, в последнее время показали многообещающие результаты в создании высококачественных вопросов. Однако известно, что эти модели также имеют основные недостатки, такие как отсутствие разнообразия и плохая структура предложений. В этой статье мы сосредоточимся на генерации вопросов над базой данных SQL и предлагаем новую структуру путем расширения, извлечения и заполнения, которая сначала включает гибкие шаблоны с нейронной моделью, чтобы генерировать различные выражения вопросов с руководством по структуре предложений. Кроме того, предлагается новый механизм активации/деактивации для генерации последовательности на основе шаблона, который учится различать шаблоны и шаблоны контента, тем самым дополнительно повышая качество генерации. Мы проводим эксперименты на двух крупномасштабных кросс-доменных наборах данных. Эксперименты показывают, что превосходство нашего метода генерации вопросов в создании более разнообразных вопросов при сохранении высокого качества и последовательности как при автоматической оценке, так и при оценке человеком.', 'ga': 'Léirigh samhlacha seicheamh-go-seicheamh-bhunaithe torthaí geallta le déanaí maidir le ceisteanna ardcháilíochta a ghiniúint. Mar sin féin, is eol freisin go bhfuil príomh-mhíbhuntáistí ag na samhlacha seo mar easpa éagsúlachta agus droch-struchtúir abairtí. Sa pháipéar seo, dírímid ar ghiniúint ceisteanna thar bhunachar sonraí SQL agus molaimid creat úrnua trí leathnú, aisghabháil agus inlíonadh a ionchorpraíonn ar dtús teimpléid sholúbtha le múnla néarbhunaithe chun léirithe éagsúla ceisteanna a ghiniúint le treoir struchtúr abairtí. Ina theannta sin, moltar meicníocht nua gníomhachtaithe/díghníomhaithe le haghaidh giniúint seicheamh-go-seicheamh bunaithe ar theimpléad, a fhoghlaimíonn conas idirdhealú a dhéanamh ar phatrúin teimpléid agus ar phatrúin ábhair, rud a fheabhsaíonn cáilíocht na giniúna tuilleadh. Déanaimid turgnaimh ar dhá thacar sonraí tras-fearainn ar scála mór. Léiríonn na turgnaimh go bhfuil barr feabhais ár modh giniúna ceisteanna i dtáirgeadh ceisteanna níos éagsúla agus ag an am céanna ardchaighdeán agus comhsheasmhacht a chothabháil faoi mheastóireacht uathoibríoch agus meastóireacht dhaonna.', 'el': 'Τα μοντέλα που βασίζονται σε ακολουθία σε ακολουθία έχουν πρόσφατα δείξει πολλά υποσχόμενα αποτελέσματα στη δημιουργία ερωτήσεων υψηλής ποιότητας. Ωστόσο, αυτά τα μοντέλα είναι επίσης γνωστό ότι έχουν κύρια μειονεκτήματα, όπως έλλειψη διαφορετικότητας και κακές δομές ποινών. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εστιάζουμε στη δημιουργία ερωτήσεων πέρα από τη βάση δεδομένων και προτείνουμε ένα νέο πλαίσιο με επέκταση, ανάκτηση και συμπλήρωση που ενσωματώνει πρώτα ευέλικτα πρότυπα με ένα νευρωνικό μοντέλο για την παραγωγή ποικίλων εκφράσεων ερωτήσεων με καθοδήγηση δομής προτάσεων. Επιπλέον, προτείνεται ένας νέος μηχανισμός ενεργοποίησης/απενεργοποίησης για τη δημιουργία ακολουθίας-ακολουθίας με βάση πρότυπα, ο οποίος μαθαίνει να διακρίνει μοτίβα προτύπων και μοτίβα περιεχομένου, βελτιώνοντας έτσι περαιτέρω την ποιότητα παραγωγής. Διεξάγουμε πειράματα σε δύο μεγάλα σύνολα δεδομένων μεταξύ τομέων. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι η υπεροχή της μεθόδου δημιουργίας ερωτήσεων μας στην παραγωγή πιο ποικίλων ερωτήσεων διατηρώντας παράλληλα υψηλή ποιότητα και συνέπεια τόσο στην αυτόματη αξιολόγηση όσο και στην ανθρώπινη αξιολόγηση.', 'hu': 'A szekvencia-szekvencia alapú modellek a közelmúltban ígéretes eredményeket mutattak a kiváló minőségű kérdések generálásában. Ugyanakkor ezeknek a modelleknek a fő hátrányai vannak, mint például a sokszínűség hiánya és a rossz mondatszerkezet. Ebben a tanulmányban az SQL adatbázison keresztül történő kérdések generálására összpontosítunk, és egy új keretrendszert javasolunk bővítésével, visszakeresésével és kitöltésével, amely először rugalmas sablonokat tartalmaz egy neurális modellel, hogy különböző kérdések kifejezéseit a mondatszerkezet irányításával generálja. Ezenkívül új aktiválási/deaktiválási mechanizmust javasoltak a sablon alapú sorozat-sorozat generálására, amely megtanulja megkülönböztetni a sablonmintákat és a tartalmi mintákat, így tovább javítja a generáció minőségét. Kísérleteket végzünk két nagyszabású, több domain adatkészleten. A kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy kérdés generálási módszerünk felsőbbrendűsége a különböző kérdések előállításában, miközben magas minőséget és következetességet tartunk fenn mind automatikus értékelés, mind emberi értékelés során.', 'ka': 'შედეგების შედეგების შედეგების მოდელები ახლა აჩვენებულია, რომლებიც უფრო მაღალური კითხვების შექმნის შედეგები. მაგრამ, ეს მოდელები უცნობიან, რომ არსებობს მნიშვნელოვანი განსხვავებას და ცნობილის სტრუქტურაციას. ამ დოკუნტში, ჩვენ კითხვების განვითარებაზე SQL ბაზატატის შესახებ და პრომენტის კონფიგურაციას გავითარებით, გავითარებით და გადავითარებით, რომელიც პირველად ნეიროლური მოდელზე ფექციური შაბლონები შექმნა დამატებით, ახალი აქტივაცია/დიაკტივაცია მექანიზმი იყენება შაბლონის განსაზღვრებისთვის, რომელიც დისკრიმინაცია შაბლონის შაბლონის შაბლონის და შემდგომარების შაბლონის შესაძლებელად ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტები ექსპერიმენტები ორი დიდი დიდი დიდი დიატომენტის დანახვა. ექსპერიმენტები აჩვენებენ, რომ ჩვენი კითხვის წარმოდგენის მეტის უფრო მეტი განსხვავებული კითხვების შექმნა, როცა უფრო მეტი წარმოდგენა, როცა უფრო მეტი კალგატი და', 'it': 'I modelli basati su sequenza a sequenza hanno recentemente mostrato risultati promettenti nella generazione di domande di alta qualità. Tuttavia, questi modelli sono anche noti per avere i principali svantaggi come la mancanza di diversità e strutture di frasi cattive. In questo articolo, ci concentriamo sulla generazione di domande su database SQL e proponiamo un nuovo framework espandendo, recuperando e riempiendo che incorpora inizialmente modelli flessibili con un modello basato su neurali per generare diverse espressioni di domande con guida alla struttura delle frasi. Inoltre, viene proposto un nuovo meccanismo di attivazione/disattivazione per la generazione sequenza-sequenza basata su modelli, che impara a discriminare modelli di template e modelli di contenuto, migliorando così ulteriormente la qualità della generazione. Conduciamo esperimenti su due set di dati cross-domain su larga scala. Gli esperimenti dimostrano che la superiorità del nostro metodo di generazione delle domande nel produrre domande più diverse pur mantenendo alta qualità e coerenza sia nella valutazione automatica che nella valutazione umana.', 'kk': 'Жоғары сапатты сұрақтарды жасау үлгілері жақын көрсетілді. Бірақ бұл үлгілердің негізгі сәйкестіктері, мысалы, әртүрлі және жарамсыз сөйлеменің құрылымы жоқ. Бұл қағазда, SQL деректер қорына сұрақ құрылуына көңіл және сөйлеме құрылғыларының түрлі сұрақтарын құру үшін біріншіден гибсиялы үлгілерді неврал негіздеген үлгілерді жасап, қалпына келтіріп, қалпына келтірі Қосымша, үлгілер мен мазмұның үлгілерін дискриминациялау үлгілерін және мазмұның үлгілерін өзгерту үшін жаңа белсендіру/өшіру механизмі үлгілеріне негізделген реттеу мен реттеу үлгілерін қ Біз екі үлкен деңгейіндегі деректер қорларында тәжірибелерді жасаймыз. Тәжірибелер біздің сұрақ құру әдісіміздің көптеген сұрақтарды жасау әдісінің көптеген сауатты және автоматты түрде оқиға және адамның оқиғаларының қасиетті қалдыр', 'mk': 'Моделите базирани на секвенца во секвенца неодамна покажаа ветувачки резултати во генерирањето висококвалитетни прашања. Сепак, овие модели, исто така, се познати дека имаат главни недостатоци како што се недостатокот на различност и лошите структури на реченици. Во овој документ, се фокусираме на генерацијата на прашања преку базата на податоци на SQL и предложуваме нова рамка со проширување, преземање и проширување кои прво вклучуваат флексибилни шаблони со нервен модел за генерање различни изрази на прашања со упатуваое на структурата на речен Покрај тоа, се предложува нов механизам за активација/деактивација за генерација секвенца по секвенца базирана на шаблони, кој научи да дискриминира шаблони и шаблони на содржина, со што понатаму се подобрува квалитетот на генерацијата. Правиме експерименти на две големи компјутери на трансдомени податоци. Експериментите покажуваат дека супериорноста на нашиот метод на генерација на прашања во производството на поразлични прашања, при што се одржуваат високи квалитети и константност под автоматска евалуација и човечка евалуација.', 'ms': 'Model berasaskan urutan-ke-urutan baru-baru ini telah menunjukkan hasil yang berjanji dalam menghasilkan soalan kualiti tinggi. Namun, model ini juga diketahui mempunyai kelemahan utama seperti kekurangan keagamaan dan struktur kalimat buruk. Dalam kertas ini, kami fokus pada generasi soalan melalui pangkalan data SQL dan melamar kerangka baru dengan mengembangkan, mengembalikan, dan menyusun yang pertama melibatkan templat fleksibel dengan model berasaskan saraf untuk menghasilkan ungkapan-ungkapan yang berbeza soalan dengan panduan struktur kalimat. Lagipun, mekanisme aktivasi/deaktivasi baru diusulkan untuk generasi urutan-ke-urutan berdasarkan templat, yang belajar untuk mendiskriminasi corak templat dan corak kandungan, dengan itu meningkatkan kualiti generasi lebih lanjut. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada dua set data skala luas-domain. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa kebanyakan kaedah generasi soalan kita dalam menghasilkan soalan yang lebih berbeza sementara menjaga kualiti tinggi dan konsistensi di bawah penilaian automatik dan penilaian manusia.', 'ml': 'സെക്കന്\u200dസ്- ടോ- സെക്കന്\u200dസ് അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d അടുത്തുതന്നെ പ്രത്യേകിച്ചുള്ള ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഉയര്\u200dത്തുന്നതി എന്നാലും ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കും വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യാസവും മോശമായ വാക്കുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനവുമില്ലെന്നും അറിയാം. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d SQL ഡേറ്റാബേസില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുകയും, വികസിപ്പിക്കുകയും, പിന്നീട് വരുത്തുകയും, ചെയ്യുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നോവല്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമാര്\u200dക്ക് പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാ അതിനുശേഷം, ഒരു പുതിയ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനവും /നിര്\u200dജ്ജീവമാക്കുന്ന മാന്ത്രിമാതൃകങ്ങളും തരത്തിലുള്ള മാതൃകങ്ങളും വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു രണ്ട് വലിയ സ്കേള്\u200d ക്രോഡോമെന്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തുന്നു. പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ തലമുറതലമുറയുടെ മേല്\u200dനോട്ടത്തില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ചോദ്യങ്', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli bbażati fuq sekwenza għal sekwenza reċentement urew riżultati promettenti fil-ġenerazzjoni ta’ mistoqsijiet ta’ kwalità għolja. Madankollu, dawn il-mudelli huma magħrufa wkoll li għandhom żvantaġġi ewlenin bħan-nuqqas ta’ diversità u strutturi ta’ sentenzi ħżiena. F’dan id-dokument, niffokaw fuq il-ġenerazzjoni ta’ mistoqsijiet fuq il-bażi tad-dejta SQL u nipproponu qafas ġdid billi jespandu, niksbu u ninfluwenzaw li l-ewwel jinkorpora mudelli flessibbli b’mudell ibbażat fuq in-newrali biex jiġġeneraw espressjonijiet differenti ta’ mistoqsijiet b’gwida dwar l-istruttura tas-sentenzi. Barra minn hekk, huwa propost mekkaniżmu ġdid ta’ attivazzjoni/diżattivazzjoni għall-ġenerazzjoni minn sekwenza għal sekwenza bbażata fuq mudell, li jitgħallem jiddiskrimina mudelli u mudelli ta’ kontenut, u b’hekk itejjeb aktar il-kwalità tal-ġenerazzjoni. We conduct experiments on two large-scale cross-domain datasets.  L-esperimenti juru li s-superjorità tal-metodu tagħna ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ mistoqsijiet fil-produzzjoni ta’ mistoqsijiet aktar diversifikati filwaqt li tinżamm kwalità u konsistenza għolja kemm taħt evalwazzjoni awtomatika kif ukoll taħt evalwazzjoni umana.', 'mn': 'Дараагийн дараа нь дарааллаар суурилсан загварууд саяхан өндөр чанартай асуулт бий болгоход амлалтай үр дүнг харуулсан. Гэхдээ эдгээр загварууд мөн өөр өөр төрлийн, муу өгүүлбэр бүтээгдэхүүн байхгүй гэдгийг мэддэг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид SQL өгөгдлийн сан дээр асуулт бий болгон анхаарлаа анхаарлаа хандуулж, тарааж, авах болон хадгалах шинэ хэлбэрүүдийг мэдрэлийн загвар дээр анхны дараа нь сэтгэл хөрөнгө оруулж, хэлбэрийн бүтэц руу зөвлөх олон асуулт Үүнээс гадна шинэ үйл ажиллагаа/үйл ажиллагааны механизм шалгалтын дарааллаар дарааллаар дарааллаар ирэхэд санал болгож байна. Энэ нь шалгалтын загвар болон contentment загваруудыг ялгаалж суралцаж байна. Иймээс үеийн сайн ча Бид хоёр том хэмжээний өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтыг хийдэг. Тэдгээр туршилтууд бидний асуулт төрөлхтний арга зам нь илүү олон асуултуудыг бүтээхэд автоматжуулалт болон хүн төрөлхтний оюун шалгалтын дотор өндөр чанар, байдал байдлыг хадгалах боломжтой болго', 'lt': 'Neseniai iš eilės į eilę pagrįsti modeliai parodė pažadus rezultatus, sukeliančius aukštos kokybės klausimus. Tačiau žinoma, kad šie modeliai taip pat turi pagrindinių trūkumų, pavyzdžiui, įvairovės trūkumas ir blogų sakinių struktūros. Šiame dokumente daugiausia dėmesio skiriame klausimų kūrimui, o ne SQL duomenų bazei, ir siūlome naują sistemą išplečiant, išieškant ir įterpiant lanksčius šablonus su nerviniu modeliu, kad būtų galima išskirti įvairias klausimų išraiškas su sakinių struktūros gairėmis. Be to, siūlomas naujas aktyvinimo ir (arba) išjungimo mechanizmas šablonais grindžiamai sekos po sekos kūrimui, kuris išmoko diskriminuoti šablonų modelius ir turinio modelius ir taip toliau gerina gamybos kokybę. Eksperimentuojame dviejuose didelio masto tarpšakiniuose duomenų rinkiniuose. Eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų klausimų kūrimo metodo pirmenybė teikiant įvairesnius klausimus, kartu išlaikant aukštą kokybę ir nuoseklumą atliekant tiek automatinį vertinimą, tiek žmogaus vertinimą.', 'pl': 'Modele oparte na sekwencji wykazały ostatnio obiecujące rezultaty w generowaniu pytań wysokiej jakości. Jednak modele te mają również główne wady, takie jak brak różnorodności i złe struktury zdań. W niniejszym artykule skupiamy się na generowaniu pytań za pośrednictwem bazy danych SQL i proponujemy nowy framework poprzez rozszerzanie, pobieranie i napełnianie, który najpierw zawiera elastyczne szablony z modelem opartym na neuronie w celu generowania różnorodnych wyrażeń pytań z wskazówkami struktury zdań. Ponadto proponuje się nowy mechanizm aktywacji/dezaktywacji dla generowania sekwencji opartych na szablonach, który uczy się rozróżniać wzorce szablonów i wzorce treści, co dodatkowo poprawia jakość generowania. Przeprowadzamy eksperymenty na dwóch dużych zbiorach danych między domenami. Eksperymenty pokazują, że wyższość naszej metody generowania pytań w tworzeniu bardziej zróżnicowanych pytań przy zachowaniu wysokiej jakości i spójności zarówno w ramach automatycznej oceny, jak i oceny ludzkiej.', 'no': 'Sekvens- til- sekvensbaserte modeller har nyleg vist forståande resultat i oppretting av høg- kvalitetspørsmål. Desse modelane er likevel kjent til å ha hovudteikningar slik som mangling av mangfold og dårlige setningsstrukturar. I denne papiret fokuserer vi på spørsmål-generering over SQL-databasen og foreslår ein novel rammeverk ved å utvida, henta og infilere at første inkluderer fleksibel mal med ein neuralbasert modell for å laga forskjellige uttrykk av spørsmål med setningsstruktur. I tillegg er det foreslått ein ny aktivering/deaktivasjonsmekanismenyen for laging av malebasert sekvens-til-sekvens, som lærer å diskriminere malemønsterelement og innhaldsmønsterelement, slik at meir forbetrar genereringskvalitet. Vi gjev eksperimenter på to store datasett for kryss- domenet. Eksperimentane viser at overhøgden av spørsmål genereringsmetoden vårt i å produsera meir forskjellige spørsmål medan å beholda høg kvalitet og konsistens under både automatisk evaluering og menneske evaluering.', 'ro': 'Modelele bazate pe secvență la secvență au arătat recent rezultate promițătoare în generarea întrebărilor de înaltă calitate. Cu toate acestea, aceste modele sunt, de asemenea, cunoscute pentru a avea principalele dezavantaje, cum ar fi lipsa diversității și structurile frazelor proaste. În această lucrare, ne concentrăm pe generarea de întrebări peste baza de date SQL și propunem un cadru nou prin extinderea, recuperarea și completarea care încorporează mai întâi șabloane flexibile cu un model bazat pe neural pentru a genera expresii diverse de întrebări cu orientare structură de propoziții. În plus, se propune un nou mecanism de activare/dezactivare pentru generarea secvență la secvență bazată pe șabloane, care învață să discrimineze modelele șabloanelor și modelele de conținut, îmbunătățind astfel și mai mult calitatea generației. Efectuăm experimente pe două seturi de date pe scară largă între domenii. Experimentele arată că superioritatea metodei noastre de generare a întrebărilor în producerea întrebărilor mai diverse, menținând în același timp calitatea și consistența ridicată atât în evaluarea automată, cât și în evaluarea umană.', 'si': 'පරීක්ෂණයෙන් පරීක්ෂණය පරීක්ෂණය විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා. නමුත්, මේ මොඩල් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරධාන පිළිබඳින් තියෙනවා වගේම විවිධානය සහ නරක වාක්ය නිර්මාණය න මේ පැත්තේ, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න නිර්මාණයේ SQL ඩේටාබේස් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්වාස කරනවා සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න, ප්\u200dරශ ඉතින්, අලුත් සක්\u200dරිය/අක්\u200dරියාත්මක පද්ධතියක් පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය සඳහා පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය සඳහා අලුත් සක්\u200dරියාත්මක පද්ධතිය සඳහා ප්\u200dර අපි ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණ දත්ත සේට් දෙකට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න විදියට විවිධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට වඩා විවිධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා ක', 'sr': 'Modeli bazirani na sekvenci do sekvence nedavno su pokazali obećavajuće rezultate u stvaranju visokokvalitetnih pitanja. Međutim, ovi modeli su takođe poznati da imaju glavne nedostatke poput nedostatka raznolikosti i loših struktura rečenica. U ovom papiru, fokusiramo se na generaciju pitanja preko SQL baze podataka i predlažemo novi okvir proširenjem, izvešavanjem i uvođenjem kojeg prvo uključuje fleksibilne hrame sa neuralnim modelom kako bi stvorili različite izraze pitanja sa uputstvom na strukturu rečenica. Osim toga, predlaže se novi mehanizam aktivacije/deaktiviranja za generaciju sekvence na osnovu šablona, koji nauči diskriminaciju šablona i obrazaca sadržaja, tako dalje poboljšava kvalitet generacije. Vodimo eksperimente na dva velika krstodomena podataka. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je superiornost metode generacije pitanja u proizvodnji raznolikosti pitanja dok održava visoke kvalitete i konsekvencije pod automatskom procjenom i ljudskom procjenom.', 'so': "Tusaalooyinka hoose-soo-socoshada waxaa la muujiyey arimaha loo ballanqaaday inay sababto su'aalaha takhasuska sare. Si kastaba ha ahaatee tusaalahan waxaa la yaqaan inay leeyihiin dib u gaar ah, tusaale ahaan u baahan qaab kala duduwan iyo hablo xun. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa muuqasho su'aal ah oo ku qoran SQL databases waxaana soo jeedinaynaa qoraal warqad ah oo ku kordhiya, soo qaadashada, waxaana ku qoraynaa in marka ugu horeysa uu ku qoro macbudo flexible ah oo ku qoran tilmaamo neural ah si aan u sameyno su'aalo kala duduwan oo ku saabsan hagitaan structure. Markaas waxaa kaloo la soo jeedaa hab-dhaqdhaqaaq/dhaqdhaqaaq cusub oo loogu talagalay dhaqdhaqaaq-dabaq-dabaq, taasoo barta in lagu takooro noocyada template iyo noocyada waxyaabaha ku jira, sidaa darteed waxaa sii kordhiya qiimaha dhalashada. Imtixaano waxaynu ku sameynaa labada macluumaad oo kala duduwan. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in aad ka sarrayso qaababka qaababkayaga su'aalahana ay soo saaraan su'aalo kala duduwan marka ay sii haystaan qiimeynta dhaqdhaqaaqa iyo qiimeynta dadkaba.", 'sv': 'Sekvens-till-sekvensbaserade modeller har nyligen visat lovande resultat när det gäller att generera högkvalitativa frågor. Men dessa modeller är också kända för att ha stora nackdelar såsom brist på mångfald och dåliga meningsstrukturer. I denna uppsats fokuserar vi på frågegenerering över SQL-databas och föreslår ett nytt ramverk genom att expandera, hämta och fylla i som först inkorporerar flexibla mallar med en neuralbaserad modell för att generera olika uttryck av frågor med meningsstruktur vägledning. Dessutom föreslås en ny aktiverings-/avaktiveringsmekanism för mallbaserad sekvens-till-sekvensgenerering, som lär sig att särskilja mallmönster och innehållsmönster, vilket ytterligare förbättrar produktionskvaliteten. Vi utför experiment på två storskaliga datauppsättningar över domäner. Experimenten visar att vår frågegenerationsmetods överlägsenhet när det gäller att producera mer olika frågor samtidigt som hög kvalitet och konsekvens upprätthålls under både automatisk utvärdering och mänsklig utvärdering.', 'ta': 'Sequence-to-sequence based models have recently shown promising results in generating high-quality questions.  எனினும், இந்த மாதிரிகளுக்கும் முக்கிய பின்னணிகள் இருக்கும் போதும் பல்வேறு மற்றும் கெட்ட வாக்கின் கட் இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் SQL தரவுத்தளத்தில் கேள்வி உருவாக்கத்தை கவனம் செலுத்தி ஒரு புதிய சட்டத்தை விரிவாக்கி, பிரித்து மற்றும் சேர்த்து முதலில் flexible வார்ப்புர அதற்கும், வார்ப்புரு அடிப்படையில் அடிப்படையான தொடர்ச்சி தலைமுறைக்கு புதிய செயல்பாடு/செயல்படுத்தல் முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக்கப்படுகிறது, அது வார்ப்ப நாம் இரண்டு பெரிய அளவு கடந்த தரவுத்தளங்களில் சோதனைகளை செய்கிறோம். சோதனைகள் தானியங்கி மதிப்பு மற்றும் மனித மதிப்பீட்டின் கீழும் தானியங்கி மதிப்பிலும் இருந்து மேலும் வேறு கேள்விகள் உருவாக்கும்', 'ur': 'سکوئنس-سے-سکوئنس بنیادی موڈل اچھے وقت اچھی کیفیت سوال جوڑنے کے لئے وعدہ کے نتائج دکھائے گئے ہیں. لیکن یہ موڈل بھی معلوم ہوتے ہیں کہ ان کی اصلی دفعہ ہے جیسے مختلف اور بری جماعت کی ساختاری کمی ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم سؤال کی نسل SQL ڈیٹابیس پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں اور ایک نئی فرم ڈیٹابیس کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ اسے پھیلاتے، پھیلاتے، پھیلاتے، اور سوال کریں جو پہلی بار ایک نئورل بنیادی موڈل کے ساتھ فلکسیٹ ٹیپلٹ میں شامل کرتا ہے کہ اس کے سوال کی مخ اور اس کے علاوہ، ایک نئی فعالیت/فعالیت مکانیزین کی پیشنهاد کی جاتی ہے ٹیپلٹ-بنیاد سطح-تا-سطح کی نسل کے لئے، جو ٹیپلٹ پٹرنے اور منزل پٹرنے کی تفریق سکھاتا ہے، اس طرح نسل کی کیفیت اضافہ کرتا ہے. ہم دو بڑے درجے کے کرس ڈومین ڈیٹسٹ پر آزمائش کرتے ہیں۔ آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارے سوال پیدا کرنے کے طریقے کے زیادہ مختلف سوال پیدا کرنے کے لئے اچھی کیفیت اور ثابت قدم رکھنے کے لئے ہمارے سوال پیدا کرنے کے مطابق اور انسان کی ارزش کے مطابق.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Lekin, bu modellar turli va yomon so'zlar murakkablarini yo'q deb nomlanadi. Bu qogʻozda, biz SQL maʼlumot bazasining soʻzlariga foydalanamiz va yangi freymni yoyish, qayta olish va qo'shish orqali birinchi fleksibli namunalarni qo'yish uchun bir xil muammolarni qo'yish uchun qo'l asosida yaratish uchun bir xil ifodalarni yaratish uchun foydalanish. Yangi aktivlashtirish/aktivlashtirish mechanisiyasi namuna asosida seksiyatli tarkibi yaratish uchun talab qilinadi. Namuna patternlarini va tarkib shakllarini ajratishni o'rganadi. Biz ikkita katta taʼminlovchi domen maʼlumotlar tarkibida tajribalarni bajaramiz. Tajribalar esa, savol uzoqlarimiz usulining eng darajaligi ko'proq savolllarni yaratishda va avtomatik qiymatni va inson qiymatlaridan foydalanishda yuqori darajada davom etishda.", 'vi': 'Mẫu lập chuỗi đã cho thấy kết quả hứa hẹn trong việc tạo ra những câu hỏi chất lượng cao. Tuy nhiên, những mô hình này cũng có những trở ngại chính đáng như thiếu sự đa dạng và cấu trúc án tồi tệ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi tập trung vào thế hệ câu hỏi trên cơ sở dữ liệu SQL và đề xuất một cơ sở mới bằng cách mở rộng, lấy và xâm nhập vào nó đầu tiên thông qua các mẫu linh hoạt với một mô hình thần kinh để tạo ra các biểu hiện khác nhau về cấu trúc án. Bên cạnh đó, một cơ chế kích hoạt/ Tắt mới được đề xuất cho chế tạo chuỗi-tới-trình mẫu, nó học cách phân biệt các mẫu và các mô hình nội dung, và cải thiện thêm chất lượng sản xuất. Chúng tôi tiến hành thí nghiệm trên hai tập tin thập kỉ rộng. Thử nghiệm cho thấy khả năng ưu việt của phương pháp tạo các câu hỏi của chúng ta trong việc tạo ra các câu hỏi khác nhau, đồng thời bảo vệ chất lượng cao và độ đồng nhất trong cả việc đánh giá tự động lẫn con người.', 'hr': 'Modeli bazirani na sekvenciji do sekvencije nedavno su pokazali obećavajuće rezultate u stvaranju visokokvalitetnih pitanja. Međutim, ovi modeli su također poznati da imaju glavne nedostatke poput nedostatka raznolikosti i loših struktura kazne. U ovom papiru, usredotočili smo se na generaciju pitanja nad SQL bazom podataka i predlažemo novi okvir proširenjem, povlačenjem i uvlačenjem kojeg prvo uključuje fleksibilne hrame sa neuralnim modelom kako bi stvorili različite izraze pitanja s uputstvom za strukturu rečenica. Osim toga, predlaže se novi mehanizam aktivacije/deaktiviranja za generaciju sekvence na osnovu šablona, koji uči diskriminirati obrasce šablona i obrasce sadržaja, tako dalje poboljšava kvalitet generacije. Provodimo eksperimente na dva velika krstodomena podataka. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je nadvišenost metode generacije pitanja u proizvodnji različitih pitanja dok održava visoke kvalitete i konsekvencije pod automatskom procjenom i ljudskom procjenom.', 'da': 'Sekvens-til-sekvens baserede modeller har for nylig vist lovende resultater i at generere spørgsmål af høj kvalitet. Men disse modeller er også kendt for at have største ulemper såsom mangel på mangfoldighed og dårlige sætningsstrukturer. I denne artikel fokuserer vi på spørgsmålstegnelse over SQL database og foreslår en ny ramme ved at udvide, hente og udfylde, der først inkorporerer fleksible skabeloner med en neural-baseret model til at generere forskellige udtryk af spørgsmål med sætningsstruktur vejledning. Desuden foreslås der en ny aktiverings-/deaktiveringsmekanisme for skabelonbaseret sekvens-til-sekvensgenerering, som lærer at skelne mellem skabelonmønstre og indholdsmønstre, hvilket yderligere forbedrer produktionskvaliteten. Vi udfører eksperimenter på to store datasæt på tværs af domæner. Eksperimenterne viser, at vores spørgsmålsgenereringsmetodes overlegenhed i at producere mere forskelligartede spørgsmål samtidig med at den opretholder høj kvalitet og konsistens under både automatisk evaluering og menneskelig evaluering.', 'bg': 'Моделите, базирани на последователност към последователност, напоследък показаха обещаващи резултати в генерирането на висококачествени въпроси. Въпреки това, тези модели също са известни с основни недостатъци като липса на разнообразие и лоши структури на присъди. В тази статия ние се фокусираме върху генерирането на въпроси върху база данни и предлагаме нова рамка чрез разширяване, извличане и попълване, която първо включва гъвкави шаблони с невронно базиран модел за генериране на различни изрази на въпроси с насоки за структурата на изреченията. Освен това е предложен нов механизъм за активиране/деактивиране за генериране на шаблони въз основа на последователност към последователност, който се научава да дискриминира шаблони и модели на съдържание, като по този начин допълнително подобрява качеството на генерирането. Провеждаме експерименти върху два мащабни междудомейнни набора данни. Експериментите показват, че превъзходството на нашия метод за генериране на въпроси в производството на по-разнообразни въпроси, като същевременно се поддържа високо качество и последователност както при автоматична оценка, така и при човешка оценка.', 'nl': 'Sequence-to-sequence gebaseerde modellen hebben onlangs veelbelovende resultaten laten zien in het genereren van vragen van hoge kwaliteit. Van deze modellen is echter ook bekend dat ze grote nadelen hebben, zoals gebrek aan diversiteit en slechte zinnenstructuren. In dit artikel richten we ons op het genereren van vragen via SQL-database en stellen we een nieuw framework voor door uit te breiden, op te halen en te vullen dat eerst flexibele sjablonen bevat met een neuraal-gebaseerd model om diverse uitdrukkingen van vragen te genereren met zinnenstructuurbegeleiding. Verder wordt een nieuw activerings-/deactivatiemechanisme voorgesteld voor template-gebaseerde sequence-to-sequence generatie, dat leert om template patronen en content patronen te onderscheiden, waardoor de generatiekwaliteit verder verbetert. We voeren experimenten uit op twee grootschalige cross-domein datasets. De experimenten tonen aan dat de superioriteit van onze vragengeneratie methode in het produceren van meer diverse vragen met behoud van hoge kwaliteit en consistentie onder zowel automatische evaluatie als menselijke evaluatie.', 'de': 'Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-basierte Modelle haben in letzter Zeit vielversprechende Ergebnisse bei der Generierung hochwertiger Fragen gezeigt. Allerdings sind diese Modelle auch für ihre wesentlichen Nachteile bekannt, wie mangelnde Diversität und schlechte Satzstrukturen. In diesem Beitrag konzentrieren wir uns auf die Generierung von Fragen über SQL-Datenbanken und schlagen ein neuartiges Framework vor, das zunächst flexible Vorlagen mit einem neuronalen Modell enthält, um verschiedene Ausdrücke von Fragen mit Satzstrukturführung zu generieren. Weiterhin wird ein neuer Aktivierungs-/Deaktivierungsmechanismus für die vorlagenbasierte Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Generierung vorgeschlagen, der lernt, Template-Muster und Content-Muster zu unterscheiden und so die Generierungsqualität weiter verbessert. Wir führen Experimente an zwei großen domänenübergreifenden Datensätzen durch. Die Experimente zeigen, dass die Überlegenheit unserer Fragegenerierungsmethode bei der Erzeugung vielfältigerer Fragen bei gleichzeitiger Aufrechterhaltung hoher Qualität und Konsistenz sowohl bei automatischer als auch menschlicher Auswertung ist.', 'ko': '시퀀스에서 시퀀스까지의 모델은 최근 고품질 문제를 생성하는 데 희망적인 결과를 보였다.그러나 이런 모델도 다양성과 엉망진창인 문장 구조가 부족하다는 주요 단점이 있다.본고에서 우리는 SQL 데이터베이스에서의 문제 생성을 중점적으로 연구했고 확장, 검색과 충전을 통해 새로운 구조를 제시했다. 이 구조는 먼저 유연한 템플릿과 신경을 바탕으로 하는 모델을 결합시켜 문장 구조의 지도를 가진 각종 문제 표를 생성한다.그 밖에 새로운 활성화/제거 메커니즘을 제기하여 템플릿의 서열을 바탕으로 서열 생성에 사용한다. 이 메커니즘은 템플릿 모델과 내용 모델을 구분하여 생성의 질을 더욱 높인다.우리는 두 개의 대형 크로스 데이터 집합에서 실험을 진행하였다.실험에 의하면 자동 평가와 인공 평가 상황에서 우리의 문제 생성 방법은 더 많은 다양성 문제를 생성하는 동시에 높은 품질과 일치성을 유지하는 데 우위를 가진다.', 'id': 'Model berdasarkan urutan ke urutan baru-baru ini menunjukkan hasil yang berjanji dalam menghasilkan pertanyaan kualitas tinggi. Namun, model ini juga dikenal memiliki kelemahan utama seperti kekurangan keagamaan dan struktur kalimat buruk. Dalam kertas ini, kami fokus pada generasi pertanyaan melalui pangkalan data SQL dan melamar cadangan baru dengan memperluas, mengembalikan, dan menginspirasi yang pertama mengandung templat fleksibel dengan model berasasi saraf untuk menghasilkan ekspresi berbagai pertanyaan dengan panduan struktur kalimat. Selain itu, mekanisme aktivasi/deaktivasi baru diusulkan untuk generasi urutan-ke-urutan berdasarkan templat, yang belajar untuk diskriminasi pola templat dan pola konten, sehingga lebih meningkat kualitas generasi. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada dua set data skala besar cross-domain. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa superioritas dari metode generasi pertanyaan kami dalam menghasilkan pertanyaan yang lebih berbeda sementara mempertahankan kualitas tinggi dan konsistensi di bawah evaluasi otomatis dan evaluasi manusia.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای پایه\u200cهای بعدی به بعدی اخیرا نتیجه\u200cهای قول\u200cدهنده در تولید سوال\u200cهای کیفیت بالا نشان داده\u200cاند. با این حال، این مدل\u200cها همچنین شناخته می\u200cشوند که کمک\u200cهای اصلی مانند ناتوانی مختلف و ساختارهای مجازات بد دارند. در این کاغذ، ما روی نسل سوال بر روی داده\u200cهای SQL تمرکز می\u200cکنیم و یک چهارچوب رمانی را با گسترش، پدید آوردن و وارد کردن که اولین بار templates flexible را با یک مدل بر اساس عصبی شامل می\u200cکند تا نشانه\u200cهای مختلف از سوال را با هدایت ساختار جمله تولید کند. علاوه بر این، یک مکانیسم فعالیت/فعالیت جدید برای نسل\u200cهای دسته\u200cی دسته\u200cی دسته\u200cی دسته\u200cی دسته\u200cی دسته\u200cای بر پایه\u200cی نمونه\u200cها پیشنهاد می\u200cشود، که یاد می\u200cگیرد که الگوهای قالب و الگوهای محتویات جدا کنیم، بنابراین کیفیت نسل را بیش ما آزمایش\u200cها را روی دو مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای زیادی در مقیاس مدینه انجام می\u200cدهیم. آزمایش ها نشان می دهند که بزرگترین روش نسل سوال ما در تولید سوال های مختلف بیشتری در حالی که حفظ کیفیت بالا و هماهنگی زیر ارزیابی خودکار و ارزیابی انسان است.', 'sw': 'Mfano wa mfululizo wa mfululizo wa mfululizo umeonyesha matokeo ya kutarajiwa yanayosababisha maswali ya kiwango kikubwa. Hata hivyo, mifano hii pia inafahamika kuwa na vikosi vikuu kama vile ukosefu wa miundo mbalimbali na vibaya vya hukumu. Katika karatasi hii, tunalenga uzalishaji wa takwimu za SQL na tunapendekeza mfumo wa riwaya kwa kuongeza, kurudisha, na kuingiza na kuandika kwamba kwanza unajumuisha namba zenye ubora wenye mifano ya kisasa ili kutengeneza hisia mbalimbali za maswali yenye uongozi wa miundombinu ya hukumu. Zaidi ya hayo, mfumo mpya wa upatikanaji/upatikanaji unapendekezwa kwa ajili ya kizazi cha mfululizo-kwa-mfululizo wa mazingira, ambacho kinajifunza kutafautisha miundo na mitindo ya maudhui, kwa hivyo kuboresha viwango vya kizazi. Tunafanya majaribio katika seti mbili kubwa za data za ndani. Majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa ukubwa wa njia ya kizazi chetu cha maswali katika kutengeneza maswali tofauti zaidi wakati wa kuendelea kwa kiwango kikubwa na uhalisia chini ya utafiti wa kibinafsi na utafiti wa binadamu.', 'tr': 'sequence-to-sequence daýanýan nusgalar ýakynda ýokary kaliwatly soraglary döretmäge söz berilýän netijesi görkezildi. Ýöne bu nusgalar hem özleriniň esasy çekişmeleri bolan ýaly çarpyşlyk we ýaman sözlem düzgünleriniň ýok bolmagy bilen tanalýar. Bu kagyzda, SQL databank üzerinde sorag döredilmesine üns berýäris we sözleşme strukturlary bilen üýtgetmek, çekmek we süýtgetmek üçin ilkinji gezek fleksibil modalary neutral daýanýan nusga bilen birleştirilýäris. Mundan hem, täze janlaşdyrma/gaýd etmek meýdançasyny nusgala döredip görkezilýän çäpşenler we moda döredip, şonuň üçin dörediň howplygyny bejersin. Biz iki büyük ölçek dataýet düzümlerinde deneyler çykarýarys. Denminatlar biziň soraglaryň döredilmegimiziň üstünliklerini, ýokary kalitede we adamlaryň deňleşmegi altynda, üstünliklerini we durumlygymyzy tutmaklygyny görkezýärler.', 'af': "Sequence- to- sequence gebaseerde modele het onlangs die belofte resultate in die genereer van hoë- kwaliteit vrae. Maar hierdie modele is ook bekend om hoofdrukkings te hê soos mislukking van diversiteit en slegte setstructure. In hierdie papier, ons fokus op vraag generasie oor SQL databasis en voorstel 'n roman raamwerk deur uitbreiding, herhaal en inligting wat eerste fleksibele templates met 'n neural-gebaseerde model inkorpreer om verskillende uitdrukkings van vraagte te genereer met sentence struktuur gids. Daarom is 'n nuwe aktivering/deaktiveering mekanisme voorgestel vir die sjabloon-gebaseerde sekvensie-na-sekvensie generasie, wat leer om sjabloon patrone en inhoud patrone te diskrimineer, sodat verder generasie kwaliteit verbeter. Ons uitvoer eksperimente op twee groot skaal kruisdomein datastelle. Die eksperimente wys dat die hoogheid van ons vraag generasie metode in die produksie van meer verskeie vraagte terwyl die hou van hoë kwaliteit en konsistensie onder beide automatiese evaluering en menslike evaluering behou.", 'am': 'ምርጫዎች ነገር ግን እነዚህ ምሳሌዎች የልዩ ልዩ እና የክፋት ፍርድ መሠረት እንዳይኖሩ የዋነኛው ጀርባዎች ናቸው የሚታወቁ ናቸው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የSQL ዳርዕክት ላይ የጥያቄን ትውልድ እና የመጀመሪያ የሥርዓት ግንኙነትን በመፍጠር፣ በመስጠት እና በመስጠት እና በተጨማሪው የሥርዓት ግንኙነትን ለመግለጥ የልዩ ጥያቄዎችን ለመፍጠር እናስጠጋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ አዲስ ተግባር/አዲስ አካባቢ ምርጫዎችን ለመግለጥ፣ ለጣቢያ ምርጫዎች እና የሥርዓት ምሳሌዎችን ለመለየት ይማራሉ፡፡ በሁለት ትልቁ የዶሜን ዳታተር ላይ ፈተናዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቹ የጥያቄን ትውልድ ማድረግ የበለጠ ልዩ ጥያቄዎችን በመፍጠር እና በራሱ አካላት እና በሰው ማስታወሻ በታች የሚቆጥሩ የጥያቄ ትውልድ ማድረግ የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'hy': "Հաջորդականությունը հաջորդականությամբ հիմնված մոդելները վերջերս ցույց են տվել խոստացնող արդյունքներ բարձր որակի հարցեր ստեղծելու համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս մոդելները նաև հայտնի են, որ ունեն հիմնական թերություններ, ինչպիսիք են բազմազանության բացակայությունը և վատ նախադասությունների կառուցվածքները: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք կենտրոնանում ենք հարցերի ստեղծման վրա SQL-ի բազայի միջոցով և առաջարկում ենք նոր շրջանակներ' ընդլայնելով, վերադարձնելով և ներքևելով այն, որը առաջին հերթին ներառում է ճկուն մոդելներ նյարդային հիմքով մոդելի, որպեսզի Ավելին, նոր ակտիվացման և անակտիվացման մեխանիզմ առաջարկվում է կաղապարի հիմնված հաջորդականության սերունդների համար, որը սովորում է տարբերակել կաղապարների կաղապարները և պարունակության կաղապարները, այսպիսով ավելի բարելավում է սերունդների որակը: We conduct experiments on two large-scale cross-domain datasets.  Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր հարցերի ստեղծման մեթոդի գերազանցությունը ավելի բազմազան հարցեր ստեղծելու մեջ, միևնույն ժամանակ պահպանելով բարձր որակը և կայունությունը, ինչպես ավտոմատիկ գնահատման, ինչպես նաև մարդկա", 'sq': 'Modelet bazuar në sekuencë në sekuencë kanë treguar kohët e fundit rezultate premtuese në gjenerimin e pyetjeve të cilësisë së lartë. Megjithatë, këto modele janë të njohur gjithashtu që kanë dëmtime kryesore të tilla si mungesa e diversitetit dhe strukturat e dënimeve të këqija. Në këtë letër, ne përqëndrohemi në gjenerimin e pyetjeve mbi bazën e dhënash SQL dhe propozojmë një kuadër të ri duke zgjeruar, marrë dhe përfshirë që së pari përfshin modele fleksible me një model me bazë nervore për të gjeneruar shprehje të ndryshme pyetjesh me udhëzime të strukturës së fjalëve. Përveç kësaj, një mekanizëm i ri aktivimi/deaktivimi propozohet për gjenerimin e sekuencës në sekuencë të bazuar në modele, i cili mëson të diskriminojë modelet e modeleve dhe modelet e përmbajtjeve, duke përmirësuar më tej cilësinë e gjenerimit. We conduct experiments on two large-scale cross-domain datasets.  Eksperimentet tregojnë se superioriteti i metodës sonë të gjenerimit të pyetjeve në prodhimin e pyetjeve më të ndryshme duke mbajtur cilësinë e lartë dhe konsistencën si nën vlerësimin automatik ashtu edhe nën vlerësimin njerëzor.', 'az': 'Sequence-to-sequence-based modellər son zamanlarda yüksək kaliteli suallar yaratmaq üçün və ’ d verən sonuçları göstərdilər. Ancaq bu modellər həmçinin müxtəlif və pis cümlələr qurulması kimi əsas çətinliklərə sahib olduğu kimi bilinirlər. Bu kağızda, SQL verilənlərin üstündə sual təşkilinə odaklanır və cümlələr quruluşu doğruluqları ilə müxtəlif sualları təşkil etmək, genişləmək, alınmaq və fərqləmək üçün yeni bir framework təklif edirik. Daha sonra, şablon-sıralama-sıralama-sıralama nəsili üçün yeni fəaliyyat/etkinləşmə mehanizmisi təbliğ edilir. Bu, şablon modellərini və məlumat modellərini ayırmaq öyrənir, böylece nəsillərin keyfiyyətini daha da yaxşılaşdırır. Biz iki böyük ölçülü çox domain veri qurularında təcrübələr edirik. Həqiqətən, təcrübələrimiz sual nəslimizin üstünlüyünü göstərir ki, daha çox müxtəlif suallar yaratmaq üçün, həmçin in yüksək qiyməti və həmçinin insan değerlendirməsi altında, həmçinin özünüzə təcrübə etmək üçün, özünüzə təcr', 'bs': 'Modeli bazirani na sekvenciji do sekvencije nedavno su pokazali obećavajuće rezultate u stvaranju visokokvalitetnih pitanja. Međutim, ovi modeli su također poznati da imaju glavne nedostatke poput nedostatka raznolikosti i loših struktura kazne. U ovom papiru, fokusiramo se na generaciju pitanja preko baze podataka SQL-a i predlažemo novi okvir proširenjem, povlačenjem i uvlačenjem kojeg prvo uključuje fleksibilne hrame sa neuralnim modelom kako bi stvorili različite izraze pitanja sa uputstvom na strukturu rečenica. Osim toga, predlaže se novi mehanizam aktivacije/deaktiviranja za generaciju sekvence na osnovu šablona, koji nauči diskriminirati šablone i obrasce sadržaja, tako dalje poboljšava kvalitet generacije. Vodimo eksperimente na dva velika krstodomena podataka. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je superiornost metode generacije pitanja u proizvodnji raznolikosti pitanja dok održava visoke kvalitete i konsekvencije pod automatskom procjenom i ljudskom procjenom.', 'ca': "Models basats en seqüència a seqüència han demostrat recentment resultats prometedors en generar preguntes d'alta qualitat. Però també és conegut que aquests models tenen inconvenients principals com la falta de diversitat i les males estructures de frases. En aquest paper, ens centrem en la generació de preguntes sobre la base de dades SQL i proposem un nou marc expandint, recuperant i infiltrant que primer incorpora models flexibles amb un model basat en neurones per generar diverses expressions de preguntes amb orientació sobre l'estructura de frases. A més, es propone un nou mecanisme d'activació/desactivació per a generar seqüències a seqüències basades en models, que aprenen a discriminar patrons de models i patrons de contingut, millorant així la qualitat de la generació. Fem experiments en dos conjunts de dades a gran escala. Els experiments demostren que la superioritat del nostre mètode de generació de preguntes en produir preguntes més diverses mentre mantenim alta qualitat i consistencia sota l'evaluació automàtica i l'evaluació humana.", 'cs': 'Modely založené na sekvenci v poslední době ukázaly slibné výsledky při generování vysoce kvalitních otázek. Je však známo, že tyto modely mají také hlavní nevýhody, jako je nedostatek rozmanitosti a špatné struktury vět. V tomto článku se zaměřujeme na generování otázek prostřednictvím SQL databáze a navrhujeme nový framework rozšiřováním, načítáním a plněním, který nejprve zahrnuje flexibilní šablony s neuronovým modelem pro generování různých výrazů otázek s vedením struktury vět. Dále je navržen nový aktivační/deaktivační mechanismus pro generování sekvencí na bázi šablony, který se naučí rozlišovat vzory šablony a obsahové vzory, a tím dále zlepšuje kvalitu generování. Provádíme experimenty na dvou rozsáhlých datových sadách mezi doménami. Experimenty ukazují, že nadřazenost naší metody generování otázek při vytváření různorodějších otázek při zachování vysoké kvality a konzistence jak při automatickém vyhodnocování, tak i při hodnocení lidí.', 'et': 'Järjest järjestusse põhinevad mudelid on hiljuti näidanud paljutõotavaid tulemusi kvaliteetsete küsimuste tekitamisel. Teadaolevalt on nendel mudelitel ka peamised puudused, nagu mitmekesisuse puudumine ja halb karistusstruktuur. Käesolevas töös keskendume küsimuste genereerimisele SQL-andmebaasi kaudu ja pakume välja uue raamistiku laiendamise, hankimise ja täitmise kaudu, mis kõigepealt sisaldab paindlikke malle neuraalpõhise mudeliga, et genereerida erinevaid küsimuste väljendeid lausestruktuuri juhendamisega. Lisaks sellele pakutakse välja uus aktiveerimis-/deaktiveerimismehhanism mallipõhiseks järjestuste genereerimiseks, mis õpib diskrimineerima malli mustreid ja sisumustreid, parandades seega veelgi generatsiooni kvaliteeti. Me teeme katseid kahe suuremahulise valdkondadevahelise andmekogumiga. Katsed näitavad, et meie küsimuste genereerimise meetod on parem mitmekesisemate küsimuste tootmisel, säilitades samas kvaliteedi ja järjepidevuse nii automaatse hindamise kui ka inimese hindamise korral.', 'fi': 'Sekvenssi-sekvenssiin perustuvat mallit ovat viime aikoina osoittaneet lupaavia tuloksia korkealaatuisten kysymysten tuottamisessa. Näillä malleilla tiedetään kuitenkin olevan merkittäviä haittoja, kuten monimuotoisuuden puute ja huonot tuomiorakenteet. Tässä artikkelissa keskitymme kysymysten tuottamiseen SQL-tietokannan kautta ja ehdotamme uutta kehystä laajentamalla, noutamalla ja täyttämällä, joka ensin sisältää joustavia malleja neuropohjaisella mallilla luodaksemme erilaisia kysymyksiä lauserakenteen ohjauksella. Lisäksi ehdotetaan uutta aktivointi- ja deaktivointimekanismia mallipohjaiselle sekvenssipohjaiselle generoinnille, joka oppii erottelemaan mallikuvioita ja sisältökuvioita, mikä parantaa edelleen generoinnin laatua. Teemme kokeita kahdella laajamittaisella monialaisella aineistolla. Kokeet osoittavat, että kysymystenkeräysmenetelmämme on ylivoimainen monimuotoisempien kysymysten tuottamisessa säilyttäen samalla korkean laadun ja johdonmukaisuuden sekä automaattisessa että inhimillisessä arvioinnissa.', 'bn': 'সেকেন্স- থেকে সেকেন্স ভিত্তিক মডেল সম্প্রতি প্রতিশ্রুতিশীল ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করেছে যা উচ্চমান প্রশ্ন তৈরি করে। তবে এই মডেলগুলো প্রধান আবর্জনা আছে যেমন বৈচিত্র্যের অভাব এবং খারাপ কাঠামোর অভাব। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা SQL ডাটাবেসের উপর প্রশ্ন প্রজন্মের দিকে মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি এবং বিস্তৃত, পুনরুদ্ধার এবং প্রস্তাব করছি যে প্রথম ফ্লিক্সিয়াল মন্দিরগুলোতে একটি নিউরুল ভিত্তি এছাড়াও, একটি নতুন কার্যক্রম/নিষ্ক্রিয় পদ্ধতির প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে মন্দির ভিত্তিক সেকেন্স-থেকে সেকেন্স প্রজন্মের জন্য, যা মন্দির প্রাপ্ত patterns এবং বিষ আমরা দুই বড় স্কেলের ক্রস-ডোমেইন ডাটাসেটে পরীক্ষা করি। এই পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রশ্ন প্রজন্মের প্রজন্মের মাধ্যমে আরো বিভিন্ন প্রশ্ন তৈরি করা উচ্চমান এবং স্বয়ংক্রিয় মানুষে', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Kayya, da haka, za'a san waɗannan misalin su da juyin bayani kamar manyan tsaro mai baƙata da cire mai kyau. Daga wannan takardan, Munã fokus wa masu tambaya a kan danna SQL kuma Muke ƙayyade wata firam na nowaya da za'a faɗa ɗa, riƙe, kuma ana ƙara, da kuma a shigar da shi farkon ya shigar da wasu namoyi na fleksibo da wani misali wanda ke asansa da neural dõmin ya ƙãga masu ƙidãya masu tambayar da shiryarwa na tsarin sigar. Furan, an buƙata wata shirin aikin/canje-canjeni wa kizaje-sauri-zuwa-sauri-mazaɓa, wanda yana yarda da yin gaura da tsarin namuna da tsarin maɓallin, don haka yana ƙara kyauta tsarin kizaci. Munã samun jarrabãwa a kan data masu tsakiya biyu mai girma. jarrabai na nũna cewa, mafifici na hanyor zayenmu na tambayar ta sami masu tambayar dabam-dabam a lokacin da za'a tsare tsari da daidaita a ƙarƙashin ƙaddara da rabon mutum.", 'sk': 'Modeli, ki temeljijo na zaporedju na zaporedju, so v zadnjem času pokazali obetavne rezultate pri ustvarjanju visokokakovostnih vprašanj. Vendar pa je znano, da imajo ti modeli tudi glavne pomanjkljivosti, kot so pomanjkanje raznolikosti in slabe strukture kazni. V tem prispevku se osredotočamo na ustvarjanje vprašanj prek podatkovne baze SQL in predlagamo nov okvir z razširitvijo, pridobivanjem in polnjenjem, ki najprej vključuje fleksibilne predloge z nevronsko osnovanim modelom za ustvarjanje različnih izrazov vprašanj z vodenjem za strukturo stavkov. Poleg tega je predlagan nov mehanizem aktivacije/deaktivacije za generiranje zaporedja v zaporedje, ki temelji na predlogah, ki se nauči razlikovati vzorce predlog in vzorce vsebine, s čimer se dodatno izboljša kakovost generacije. Izvajamo eksperimente na dveh obsežnih meddomenskih naborih podatkov. Poskusi kažejo, da je naša metoda ustvarjanja vprašanj superiorna pri izdelavi bolj raznolikih vprašanj ob ohranjanju visoke kakovosti in doslednosti tako pri avtomatičnem ocenjevanju kot pri človeku.', 'he': 'דוגמנים מבוססים ברצף לרצף הראו לאחרונה תוצאות מבטיחות ביצירת שאלות איכות גבוהה. עם זאת, מודלים אלה ידועים גם שיש חסרות ראשיות כמו חוסר מגוון ומבני משפטים רעים. בעיתון הזה, אנו מתמקדים בדור שאלות על בסיס הנתונים SQL ומציעים מסגרת חדשה על ידי הרחיבה, השיגה, והקיבלה כי קודם מכיל מודלים גמישים עם מודל מבוסס עצבי כדי ליצור ביטויים מגוונים של שאלות עם כיוון מבנה משפטים. חוץ מזה, מנגנון הפעלה/הפעלה חדש מוצע לדור רצף-לרצף מבוסס על דוגמנים, שמלמד להפריד דפוסי דוגמנים ודפוסי תוכן, כך משפר עוד איכות הדור. אנו מבצעים ניסויים על שני קבוצות נתונים ברמה גדולה. הניסויים מראים שהשליטה של שיטת הדור השאלות שלנו בייצור שאלות מגוונות יותר בזמן שמירת איכות גבוהה ותקבלות תחת הערכה אוטומטית וגם הערכה אנושית.', 'bo': 'sequence-to-sequence based models have recently shown promising results in generating high-quality questions. ཡིན་ནའང་། མིག་ལམ་འདི་དག་ལ་རྩ་བའི་བྲིས་རིས་ཀྱང་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་མིན་འདུག། In this paper, we focus on question generation over SQL database and propose a novel framework by expanding, retrieving, and infilling that first incorporates flexible templates with a neural-based model to generate diverse expressions of questions with sentence structure guidance. དེ་མིན་ན། དཔེ་དབྱིབས་bazeུབ་པའི་གོ་རིམ་ལྟར་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱ་སྤྱོད་གསར་པ་ཞིག་བྱས་ཡོད། དཔེ་དབྱིབས་གཟུགས་རིས་དང་ནང་དོན་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་དེ་ ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ཚད་ལྡན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་མཐོ་བྱུང་བའི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཚད་འཛིན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། experiments show that the superiority of our question generation method in producing more diverse questions while maintaining high quality and consistency under automatic evaluation and human evaluation.', 'jv': "Menu item to Open 'Search for Open Files' dialog Nanging, model iki dadi wis ngerasakno karo akeh dolanan ping dumadhi, kaya nguasah jenis lan akeh dumadhi winih. Nang mapun iki, kita dipun nggo langgar-langgar wiirketana karo databasa KSL lan supoyo ingkang basa sing nyelehake duwé nggawe ngupakan, iso nglanggar, iso nglanggar sampeyan sampeyan sampeyan sampeyan liyane karo model sing bisa nyelehake nggo ndeaksi winih dhéwé, winih, lan nglanggar sampeyan liyane Label We konduted testis on Two big-scale interdomain dataset. Awak dhéwé éntuk perbudhakan kanggo ngerasah akeh cara-suarané awak dhéwé, nik awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing gak dhéwé, ngono iso nggawe kalité luwih apik lan nggawe nguasah akeh dhéwé, kuwi perusahaan manut karo cara"}
{'en': 'Handling Out-Of-Vocabulary Problem in Hangeul Word Embeddings', 'ar': 'معالجة مشكلة خارج المفردات في تطريز كلمة الهانغول', 'fr': 'Gestion des problèmes de non-vocabulaire dans les intégrations de mots Hangeul', 'pt': 'Lidando com problemas de falta de vocabulário em incorporações de palavras Hangeul', 'es': 'Manejo del problema de la falta de vocabulario en las incrustaciones de palabras en', 'zh': '治韩文词嵌中词汇外', 'ja': 'ハンギョレの単語埋め込みにおける語彙の問題の処理', 'hi': 'Hangeul Word एम्बेडिंग में आउट-ऑफ-शब्दावली समस्या को संभालना', 'ru': 'Решение проблемы вне лексики во вложенных словарях хангыль', 'ga': 'Ag Láimhseáil Fhadhb As Focal i Leabú Focal Hangeul', 'ka': 'სიტყვალის გარეშე პრობლემების გარეშე', 'hu': 'A Hangeul Word beágyazások szókincsén kívüli problémáinak kezelése', 'el': 'Αντιμετώπιση προβλήματος εκτός λεξιλογίου σε Ενσωματώσεις λέξεων Hangeul', 'it': 'Gestione del problema fuori dal vocabolario nelle incorporazioni di parole Hangeul', 'kk': 'Сөздерден тыс сөздерді шешу мәселесі', 'lt': 'Klausimų, susijusių su žodžių įrašymu Hangeul, pašalinimu iš žodyno', 'mk': 'Работење на проблемот надвор од речникот во вградувањата на зборови Hangeul', 'ms': 'Mengurus Masalah Keluar-Dari-Kata dalam Penjelmaan Kata Hangeul', 'ml': 'ഹാങ്ജിയുള്\u200d വാക്ക് എംബെഡിങ്ങിലുള്ള പ്രശ്നം', 'mt': 'L-indirizzar tal-problema barra mill-vokabularija fl-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem Hangeul', 'mn': 'Гүйцэтгэл үг нэвтрүүлэх асуудал', 'pl': 'Rozwiązywanie problemu poza słownikiem w osadzeniach słowniczych Hangeul', 'ro': 'Gestionarea problemei în afara vocabularului în încorporările Hangeul Word', 'sr': 'Riješavanje problema sa izvan reči', 'si': 'හැන්ගුල් වචනය සම්බන්ධ විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්න', 'so': 'Dhibaatooyinka soo baxa-Of-Vocabulary', 'sv': 'Hantera problem utanför ordförråd i Hangeul Word Inbäddningar', 'ta': 'சொல்லாக்க பிரச்சினைகளை செயல்படுத்து', 'ur': 'ہنگیل کلمات انڈینگ میں بوسیدہ کلمات مشکل تحمل کرنے والی ہے', 'no': 'Handlerer problem med utrykk av ordsamlingar i innbygging av teksten', 'vi': 'Xử lý vấn đề trào lưu trong môi trường chữ Hangeul', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Работа с проблем извън речника в вгражданията на думи в Hangeul', 'nl': 'Problemen met niet-woordenschat oplossen in Hangeul Word Embeddings', 'da': 'Håndtering af problem uden for ordforråd i Hangeul Word Embeddings', 'id': 'Menyelesaikan masalah dari kata-kata dalam penyembuhan kata Hangeul', 'hr': 'Problem s izvan riječnika u uključenju Hangeul riječi', 'ko': '한글 단어 삽입 어휘표 외 문제 처리', 'fa': 'تحمل مشکل کلمات بیرون', 'de': 'Behandlung von Problemen mit Nicht-Vokabeln in Hangeul Word Embeddings', 'sw': 'Tatizo la Utoaji wa Kireno katika Matokeo ya Kireno', 'sq': 'Përdorimi i problemeve të jashtëzakonshëm në përfshirjet e fjalëve Hangeul', 'am': 'የመልእክት ቀለም', 'af': 'Handteer uit- van- woorde- woord- probleem in Hangeul Woord Inbetering', 'hy': 'Բառարանից դուրս գտնվող խնդիրների լուծելը', 'az': 'D톛rgahl캼 S칬zl칲k 캻fad톛l톛rind톛 S칬zl칲k 캻fad톛si', 'bn': 'হ্যাঙ্গিউল শব্দের অভ্যন্তরে বাইরে শব্দভাণ্ডারের সমস্যা', 'tr': 'Hangeul Sözi Aňlamakda Senediň Senedi Göçirmekleri', 'ca': 'Handling Out-Of-Vocabulary Problem in Hangeul Word Embeddings', 'bs': 'Riješavanje problema sa izvan riječica u vezi obezbeđenih riječi', 'cs': 'Řešení problému mimo slovní zásobu v Hangeul Word Embeddings', 'et': 'Sõnavara puudumise probleemi käsitlemine Hangeuli sõnavara manustamises', 'fi': 'Sanaston ulkopuolisen ongelman käsittely Hangeul Word Embeddingsissä', 'ha': 'Handling Out-Of-Vocabulary Problem in Hangeul Word Embeddings', 'sk': 'Obravnavanje težav z izven besedišča v vdelavah besed Hangeul', 'he': 'לטפל בבעיה מחוץ למילים בהקפיצות מילים', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'bo': 'Hangeul ཡི་གེའི་ནང་དུ་ཕྱི་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་'}
{'en': 'Word embedding is considered an essential factor in improving the performance of various Natural Language Processing (NLP) models. However, it is hardly applicable in real-world datasets as word embedding is generally studied with a well-refined corpus. Notably, in Hangeul (Korean writing system), which has a unique writing system, various kinds of Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) appear from typos. In this paper, we propose a robust Hangeul word embedding model against typos, while maintaining high performance. The proposed model utilizes a Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) architecture with a channel attention mechanism that learns to infer the original word embeddings. The model train with a dataset that consists of a mix of typos and correct words. To demonstrate the effectiveness of the proposed model, we conduct three kinds of intrinsic and extrinsic tasks. While the existing embedding models fail to maintain stable performance as the noise level increases, the proposed model shows stable performance.', 'ar': 'يعتبر تضمين الكلمات عاملاً أساسيًا في تحسين أداء مختلف نماذج معالجة اللغة الطبيعية (NLP). ومع ذلك ، فإنه نادرًا ما يكون قابلاً للتطبيق في مجموعات البيانات الواقعية حيث تتم دراسة تضمين الكلمات بشكل عام باستخدام مجموعة مصقولة جيدًا. وتجدر الإشارة إلى أنه في نظام الكتابة الكوري Hangeul ، الذي يحتوي على نظام كتابة فريد ، تظهر أنواع مختلفة من المفردات (OOV) من الأخطاء المطبعية. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نموذجًا قويًا لتضمين كلمة Hangeul ضد الأخطاء المطبعية ، مع الحفاظ على الأداء العالي. يستخدم النموذج المقترح بنية الشبكة العصبية التلافيفية (CNN) مع آلية انتباه القناة التي تتعلم استنتاج الكلمة الأصلية المزخرفة. يتدرب النموذج مع مجموعة بيانات تتكون من مزيج من الأخطاء المطبعية والكلمات الصحيحة. لإثبات فعالية النموذج المقترح ، نجري ثلاثة أنواع من المهام الداخلية والخارجية. بينما تفشل نماذج التضمين الحالية في الحفاظ على أداء مستقر مع زيادة مستوى الضوضاء ، يُظهر النموذج المقترح أداءً مستقرًا.', 'es': 'La incrustación de palabras se considera un factor esencial para mejorar el rendimiento de varios modelos de procesamiento del lenguaje natural (NLP). Sin embargo, no es aplicable en conjuntos de datos del mundo real, ya que la incrustación de palabras generalmente se estudia con un corpus bien refinado. En particular, en Hangeul (sistema de escritura coreano), que tiene un sistema de escritura único, aparecen varios tipos de fuera de vocabulario (OOV) a partir de errores tipográficos. En este artículo, proponemos un modelo robusto de incrustación de palabras en Hangeul contra errores tipográficos, manteniendo un alto rendimiento. El modelo propuesto utiliza una arquitectura de red neuronal convolucional (CNN) con un mecanismo de atención de canal que aprende a inferir las incrustaciones de palabras originales. El modelo se entrena con un conjunto de datos que consiste en una combinación de errores tipográficos y palabras correctas. Para demostrar la eficacia del modelo propuesto, realizamos tres tipos de tareas intrínsecas y extrínsecas. Si bien los modelos de incrustación existentes no mantienen un rendimiento estable a medida que aumenta el nivel de ruido, el modelo propuesto muestra un rendimiento estable.', 'pt': 'A incorporação de palavras é considerada um fator essencial para melhorar o desempenho de vários modelos de Processamento de Linguagem Natural (PLN). No entanto, dificilmente é aplicável em conjuntos de dados do mundo real, pois a incorporação de palavras geralmente é estudada com um corpus bem refinado. Notavelmente, no Hangeul (sistema de escrita coreano), que possui um sistema de escrita único, vários tipos de Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) aparecem a partir de erros de digitação. Neste artigo, propomos um modelo robusto de incorporação de palavras Hangeul contra erros de digitação, mantendo o alto desempenho. O modelo proposto utiliza uma arquitetura de Rede Neural Convolucional (CNN) com um mecanismo de atenção de canal que aprende a inferir os embeddings de palavras originais. O modelo é treinado com um conjunto de dados que consiste em uma mistura de erros de digitação e palavras corretas. Para demonstrar a eficácia do modelo proposto, realizamos três tipos de tarefas intrínsecas e extrínsecas. Enquanto os modelos de incorporação existentes não conseguem manter um desempenho estável à medida que o nível de ruído aumenta, o modelo proposto apresenta um desempenho estável.', 'fr': "L'intégration de mots est considérée comme un facteur essentiel pour améliorer les performances de divers modèles de traitement du langage naturel (NLP). Cependant, elle n'est guère applicable dans les ensembles de données du monde réel, car l'intégration de mots est généralement étudiée avec un corpus bien affiné. Notamment, dans le Hangeul (système d'écriture coréen), qui possède un système d'écriture unique, différents types de Out-of-Vocabulary (OOV) apparaissent à partir de fautes de frappe. Dans cet article, nous proposons un modèle robuste d'intégration de mots Hangeul contre les fautes de frappe, tout en maintenant des performances élevées. Le modèle proposé utilise une architecture de réseau de neurones convolutifs (CNN) avec un mécanisme d'attention de canal qui apprend à déduire les intégrations de mots d'origine. Le train de modèles avec un jeu de données composé d'un mélange de fautes de frappe et de mots corrects. Pour démontrer l'efficacité du modèle proposé, nous menons trois types de tâches intrinsèques et extrinsèques. Alors que les modèles d'intégration existants ne parviennent pas à maintenir des performances stables à mesure que le niveau de bruit augmente, le modèle proposé affiche des performances stables.", 'ja': 'ワード埋め込みは、さまざまな自然言語処理（ NLP ）モデルのパフォーマンスを向上させるために不可欠な要素と考えられています。 しかし、単語埋め込みは一般的に十分に洗練されたコーパスで研究されているため、現実のデータセットにはほとんど適用できません。 特筆すべきは、独特の筆記体を持つハンギョレ（韓国の筆記体）では、誤字からさまざまな種類のOut - Of - Vocabulary （ OOV ）が現れることである。 本稿では、高性能を維持しつつ、誤字脱字に対する堅牢なハンギョレワード埋め込みモデルを提案する。 提案されたモデルは、元の単語埋め込みを推論することを学習するチャネル注目メカニズムを備えた畳み込みニューラルネットワーク（ CNN ）アーキテクチャを利用する。 モデルトレインは、誤字と正しい単語の組み合わせで構成されるデータセットを備えています。 提案されたモデルの有効性を実証するために、私たちは3種類の内在的および外在的なタスクを行います。 既存の埋め込みモデルは、ノイズレベルが上がるにつれて安定したパフォーマンスを維持できないが、提案されたモデルは安定したパフォーマンスを示している。', 'zh': '词以为贵自然语言(NLP)体性之要也。 然几于世界数据集,盖词嵌常以一经良改语料库也。 值得注意者,韩文独书(韩语书统)中,诸词汇外(OOV)出于拼写错误。 于本文中,立一针拼写错误鲁棒韩文词嵌模,同时持高性能。 其法用卷积神经网络(CNN)架构,架构有通道,可学推原始词嵌之。 用拼写错误正单词合数集习之。 证其有效性,三内在外。 今有嵌模噪声水平升高,犹不能保持稳定,然所提模者性定。', 'hi': 'Word embedding को विभिन्न प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण (NLP) मॉडल के प्रदर्शन में सुधार करने में एक आवश्यक कारक माना जाता है। हालांकि, यह वास्तविक दुनिया के डेटासेट में शायद ही लागू होता है क्योंकि शब्द एम्बेडिंग का आमतौर पर एक अच्छी तरह से परिष्कृत कॉर्पस के साथ अध्ययन किया जाता है। विशेष रूप से, Hangeul (कोरियाई लेखन प्रणाली) में, जिसमें एक अद्वितीय लेखन प्रणाली है, टाइपो से विभिन्न प्रकार के आउट-ऑफ-शब्दावली (ओओवी) दिखाई देते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम उच्च प्रदर्शन को बनाए रखते हुए, टाइपो के खिलाफ एक मजबूत Hangeul शब्द एम्बेडिंग मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। प्रस्तावित मॉडल एक चैनल ध्यान तंत्र के साथ एक Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) आर्किटेक्चर का उपयोग करता है जो मूल शब्द एम्बेडिंग का अनुमान लगाना सीखता है। एक डेटासेट के साथ मॉडल ट्रेन जिसमें टाइपो और सही शब्दों का मिश्रण होता है। प्रस्तावित मॉडल की प्रभावशीलता को प्रदर्शित करने के लिए, हम तीन प्रकार के आंतरिक और बाहरी कार्यों का संचालन करते हैं। जबकि मौजूदा एम्बेडिंग मॉडल शोर स्तर बढ़ने के रूप में स्थिर प्रदर्शन को बनाए रखने में विफल रहते हैं, प्रस्तावित मॉडल स्थिर प्रदर्शन दिखाता है।', 'ru': 'Встраивание слов считается существенным фактором повышения производительности различных моделей обработки естественного языка (NLP). Тем не менее, это вряд ли применимо в реальных наборах данных, так как вложение слов обычно изучается с хорошо проработанным корпусом. Примечательно, что в Хангуле (корейская система письма), которая имеет уникальную систему письма, из опечаток появляются различные виды Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV). В этой статье мы предлагаем надежную модель встраивания слов хангыль против опечаток, сохраняя при этом высокую производительность. Предлагаемая модель использует архитектуру сверточной нейронной сети (CNN) с механизмом внимания канала, который учится выводить исходные вложения слов. Модель поезд с набором данных, который состоит из смеси опечаток и правильных слов. Чтобы продемонстрировать эффективность предлагаемой модели, мы проводим три вида внутренних и внешних задач. В то время как существующие модели встраивания не могут поддерживать стабильную производительность по мере повышения уровня шума, предлагаемая модель демонстрирует стабильную производительность.', 'ga': 'Meastar gur fachtóir riachtanach é neadú focal chun feidhmíocht na múnlaí Próiseála Teanga Nádúrtha éagsúla (NLP) a fheabhsú. Mar sin féin, is ar éigean a bhaineann sé le tacair shonraí an fhíorshaol toisc go ndéantar staidéar go ginearálta ar leabú focal le corpas dea-scagtha. Go háirithe, in Hangeul (córas scríbhneoireachta na Cóiré), a bhfuil córas scríbhneoireachta uathúil aige, feictear cineálacha éagsúla As Stór Focal (OOV) ó na clóscríobháin. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid múnla láidir leabú focal Hangeul i gcoinne typos, agus ardfheidhmíocht á coinneáil ag an am céanna. Úsáideann an tsamhail atá beartaithe ailtireacht Líonra Néarach Comhdhlúite (CNN) le meicníocht aird cainéal a fhoghlaimíonn tátal a bhaint as leabú na bhfocal bunaidh. Traein samhail le tacar sonraí ina bhfuil meascán de chlóscríobháin agus de fhocail chearta. Chun éifeachtacht an mhúnla atá beartaithe a léiriú, déanaimid trí chineál tascanna intreacha agus eistreacha. Cé go dteipeann ar na samhlacha leabaithe atá ann faoi láthair feidhmíocht chobhsaí a choinneáil de réir mar a mhéadaíonn an leibhéal torainn, léiríonn an tsamhail atá beartaithe feidhmíocht chobhsaí.', 'el': 'Η ενσωμάτωση λέξεων θεωρείται ουσιαστικός παράγοντας για τη βελτίωση της απόδοσης διαφόρων μοντέλων επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Ωστόσο, δεν εφαρμόζεται σε σύνολα δεδομένων πραγματικού κόσμου, καθώς η ενσωμάτωση λέξεων μελετάται γενικά με ένα καλά εξευγενισμένο σώμα. Ιδιαίτερα, στο Χανγκεούλ (κορεατικό σύστημα γραφής), το οποίο έχει ένα μοναδικό σύστημα γραφής, εμφανίζονται διάφορα είδη εκτός λεξιλογίου (OOV) από τυπογραφικά λάθη. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα ισχυρό μοντέλο ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων ενάντια στα τυπογραφικά λάθη, διατηρώντας παράλληλα την υψηλή απόδοση. Το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο χρησιμοποιεί μια αρχιτεκτονική καμπυλωτών Νευρικών Δικτύων (ΚΝΝ) με μηχανισμό προσοχής καναλιών που μαθαίνει να συμπεραίνει τις αρχικές ενσωματώσεις λέξεων. Το μοντέλο τρένου με ένα σύνολο δεδομένων που αποτελείται από ένα μείγμα τυπογραφικών σφαλμάτων και σωστών λέξεων. Για να καταδείξουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα του προτεινόμενου μοντέλου, διεξάγουμε τρία είδη εσωτερικών και εξωτερικών εργασιών. Ενώ τα υπάρχοντα μοντέλα ενσωμάτωσης αποτυγχάνουν να διατηρήσουν σταθερή απόδοση καθώς αυξάνεται το επίπεδο θορύβου, το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο παρουσιάζει σταθερή απόδοση.', 'hu': 'A szövegbeágyazás alapvető tényezőnek tekinthető a különböző Natural Language Processing (NLP) modellek teljesítményének javításában. A valós adatkészletekben azonban aligha alkalmazható, mivel a szóbeágyazást általában finomított korpussal tanulmányozzák. Különösen a Hangeul (koreai írási rendszer), amely egyedi írási rendszerrel rendelkezik, különböző típusú Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) elírási hibák jelennek meg. Ebben a tanulmányban egy robusztus Hangeul szóbeágyazási modellt javasolunk elírási hibák ellen, miközben magas teljesítményt tartunk fenn. A javasolt modell egy Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) architektúrát használ egy csatorna figyelemmel kísérő mechanizmussal, amely megtanulja következtetni az eredeti szóbeágyazásokat. A modellvonat olyan adatkészlettel, amely elírások és helyes szavak keverékéből áll. A javasolt modell hatékonyságának bizonyítása érdekében háromféle belső és külső feladatot végzünk. Míg a meglévő beágyazási modellek nem tudnak stabil teljesítményt tartani a zajszint emelkedésével, a javasolt modell stabil teljesítményt mutat.', 'it': "L'embedding di parole è considerato un fattore essenziale per migliorare le prestazioni di vari modelli di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale (NLP). Tuttavia, è difficilmente applicabile nei set di dati del mondo reale poiché l'embedding di parole è generalmente studiato con un corpus ben raffinato. In particolare, in Hangeul (sistema di scrittura coreano), che ha un sistema di scrittura unico, vari tipi di Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) appaiono da errori di battitura. In questo articolo, proponiamo un robusto modello di embedding di parole Hangeul contro errori di battitura, pur mantenendo alte prestazioni. Il modello proposto utilizza un'architettura Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) con un meccanismo di attenzione del canale che impara a dedurre le incorporazioni di parole originali. Il modello treno con un set di dati che consiste in un mix di errori di battitura e parole corrette. Per dimostrare l'efficacia del modello proposto, svolgiamo tre tipi di compiti intrinseci ed estrinseci. Mentre i modelli di incorporazione esistenti non riescono a mantenere prestazioni stabili man mano che il livello di rumore aumenta, il modello proposto mostra prestazioni stabili.", 'ka': 'სიტყვების შეყვარება უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი ფაქტორია განსხვავებული ნაირადი ენის პროცესის (NLP) მოდელების გამოსახულებაში. მაგრამ მართლაც არაფერად მომხმარებელია რეალური მსოფლიოს მონაცემებში, როგორც სიტყვების ინტებიზაცია საუკეთესოდ უკეთესოდ დაწყებული კორპ არსებობით, ჰანგულში (კორეული წერის სისტემაში), რომელიც აქვს სუნიკალური წერის სისტემა, განსხვავებული სიტყვებლის (OOV) ტიპოდან ჩვენება. ამ დოკუნში ჩვენ გვეძლოთ ძალიან ძალიან სიტყვა, რომელიც ტიპების შემდეგ მოდელს დავყენება, როცა უფრო დიდი გამოსახულება. პროგრამეტული მოდელის გამოყენება Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) აქტიქტურაციას, რომელიც ფანალური დაახლოების მექანსისთვის, რომელიც სწავლის იგივე, რომ ორიგინალური სიტყვის შემო მოდელური მოწყობილობა მონაცემების კონფიგურაციით, რომელიც ტიპების შესახებ და სწორი სიტყვების შესახებ. ჩვენ სამი ტიპი ინტერნექტური და ექსტრინექტური დავაკეთებთ მოდელექტურის ეფექტურობას. თუმცა არსებობს მოდელები, რომლებიც არსებობს სტაბლური გამოყენება, რომლებიც სტაბლური გამოყენება, მოდელი ჩვენებს სტაბლური გამოყენება.', 'lt': 'žodžių įtraukimas laikomas esminiu veiksniu gerinant įvairių gamtinių kalbų apdorojimo (NLP) modelių veiksmingumą. Tačiau jis beveik netaikomas realaus pasaulio duomenų rinkiniams, nes žodžių įterpimas paprastai tiriamas gerai rafinuotame korpuse. Ypač Hangeul (Korėjos rašymo sistema), turinti unikalią rašymo sistemą, iš tipų atsiranda įvairių rūšių žodynų, kurie nėra žodynai. Šiame dokumente mes siūlome tvirtą Hangeul žodžių įterpimo model į prieš tipus, kartu išlaikant aukštus rezultatus. Siūlomas modelis naudoja konvoliucinio nervinio tinklo (CNN) architektūrą su kanalo dėmesio mechanizmu, kuris išmoko daryti išvadą apie pradinius žodžių įdėjimus. Traukinio modelis su duomenų rinkiniu, kurį sudaro tipų ir teisingų žodžių derinys. Siekiant įrodyti siūlomo modelio veiksmingumą, atliekame tris vidines ir išorines užduotis. While the existing embedding models fail to maintain stable performance as the noise level increases, the proposed model shows stable performance.', 'kk': 'Сөздерді ендіру әртүрлі Natural Language Processing (NLP) үлгілерін жақсарту үшін негізгі фактор деп ойлайды. Бірақ әлемдегі деректер қорларында сөздерді ендіру үшін әдетте жақсы түзетілген корпус арқылы оқылмайды. Мүмкін, Hangeul (Корея жазу жүйесінде), оның бірнеше жазу жүйесі бар, бірнеше түрлі сөздерінің "Out of Vocabulary" (OOV) түрлері типтерінен көрсетіледі. Бұл қағазда, жоғары істеу үшін, үлкен сөздерді ендіру үлгісін қолданамыз. Келтірілген үлгі бастапқы сөздерді ендіру үшін арналық қатынас механизмі арналық нейралық желі (CNN) архитектурасын қолданады. Деректер жинағындағы модель түрлі мен дұрыс сөздердің араластырылып тұрады. Келтірілген үлгісінің эффектілігін көрсету үшін біз үш түрлі ішкі және сыртқы тапсырмаларды орындаймыз. Қолданыстағы ендіру үлгілері дыбыс деңгейі өзгертілген үлгілерді дұрыс жұмыс істеуге болмайды, келтірілген үлгі дұрыс жұмыс істеуін көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Pencampuran kata dianggap faktor penting untuk meningkatkan prestasi pelbagai model Pemprosesan Bahasa Alami (NLP). Namun, ia hampir tidak berlaku dalam set data dunia nyata kerana penyembedding perkataan biasanya dipelajari dengan mayat yang baik. Terutama, dalam Hangeul (sistem tulisan Korea), yang mempunyai sistem tulisan unik, berbagai jenis Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) muncul dari tipos. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan sebuah model hangeul yang kuat untuk memasukkan perkataan terhadap tipo, sementara menjaga prestasi tinggi. Model yang diusulkan menggunakan arkitektur Rangkaian Neural Konveolutional (CNN) dengan mekanisme perhatian saluran yang belajar untuk menyimpulkan penyambungan perkataan asal. The model train with a dataset that consists of a mix of typos and correct words.  Untuk menunjukkan kegunaan model yang direncanakan, kita melakukan tiga jenis tugas dalam dan luar. Sementara model penyembedding yang wujud gagal menjaga prestasi stabil semasa aras bunyi meningkat, model yang diusulkan menunjukkan prestasi stabil.', 'mk': 'Вклучувањето на зборови се смета за суштински фактор за подобрување на резултатите на различните модели за процес на природен јазик (НЛП). Сепак, тоа едвај е применливо во реалните податоци бидејќи зборовите вградени се генерално проучуваат со добро рефиниран корпус. Посебно, во Хенгеул (корејски систем на пишување), кој има уникатен систем на пишување, се појавуваат различни видови на надвор од зборовите (OOV) од типовите. Во овој весник, предложуваме силен модел за вградување на зборот Хангеул против типовите, при што се одржува висока резултатност. Предложениот модел ја користи архитектурата на Конволуционалната неврална мрежа (CNN) со механизам на внимание на каналот кој научи да ги заклучи оригиналните зборови вградени. Моделот на возот со компјутер на податоци кој се состои од мешање на типови и правилни зборови. За да ја покажеме ефикасноста на предложениот модел, спроведуваме три видови внатрешни и надворешни задачи. Иако постојните модели за вградување не успеваат да одржат стабилна резултатност со зголемувањето на нивото на бучава, предложениот модел покажува стабилна резултатност.', 'mt': 'L-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem hija meqjusa bħala fattur essenzjali fit-titjib tal-prestazzjoni ta’ diversi mudelli ta’ Proċessar tal-Lingwi Naturali (NLP). Madankollu, huwa bilkemm applikabbli fis-settijiet tad-dejta tad-dinja reali peress li l-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem ġeneralment tiġi studjata b’korpus irfinat sew. B’mod partikolari, f’Hangeul (sistema Korean a tal-kitba), li għandha sistema unika tal-kitba, jidhru diversi tipi ta’ Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) mit-tipi. F’dan id-dokument, nipproponu mudell robust ta’ inkorporazzjoni tal-kelma Hangeul kontra t-tipi, filwaqt li nżammu prestazzjoni għolja. Il-mudell propost juża arkitettura tan-Netwerk Newrali Konveoluzzjonali (CNN) b’mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni tal-kanal li jitgħallem li jikkonkludi l-inkorporazzjonijiet oriġinali tal-kelma. Il-mudell tal-ferrovija b’sett ta’ dejta li jikkonsisti f’taħlita ta’ tipi u kliem korrett. Biex nippruvaw l-effettività tal-mudell propost, nagħmlu tliet tipi ta’ kompiti intrinsiċi u esterni. Filwaqt li l-mudelli ta’ inkorporazzjoni eżistenti jonqsu milli jżommu prestazzjoni stabbli hekk kif il-livell ta’ storbju jiżdied, il-mudell propost juri prestazzjoni stabbli.', 'ml': 'വാക്ക് ഉള്\u200dപെടുത്തുന്നത് വ്യത്യസ്താഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനപ്രക്രിയയുടെ (NLP) മോഡലുകളുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനം മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നതില എന്നാലും ശരിക്കും ലോകത്തെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d അത് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നില്ല. വാക്കുകള്\u200d പൊതുവായി വാക്കുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ഒരു നല് കാര്യത്തില്\u200d, ഹാങ്ങിയുളില്\u200d (കൊറിയയിലെ എഴുതുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d), ഒരു വ്യത്യസ്ത എഴുതുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം ഉണ്ട്, വ്യത്യസ്ത വാക്കു ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു റോബ്സ്റ്റ് ഹാങ്ങിയുള്\u200d വാക്ക് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ടൈപ്പോകള്\u200dക്കെതിരെ മോഡല്\u200d  പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d ഒരു കോണ്\u200dവോളേഷന്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ചാനല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന മെക്ക ടൈപ്പോകളുടെ കഷ്ണങ്ങളിലും ശരിയായ വാക്കുകളിലും ഉള്ള ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റുമുള്ള ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d ട്രെയിന്\u200d നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം കാണിക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d മൂന്നു തരം ആദ്യത്തിലും ഉള്ളിലുള്ള ജോലികള്\u200d നടത നിലവിലുള്ള അകത്തേക്കുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d ശബ്ദം നില വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d സ്ഥിരമായ പ്രകടനം സൂക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d പരാജയപ്', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл Процессор (NLP) загварын үйлдвэрлэлийг сайжруулахад чухал хүчин зүйл гэж үздэг. Гэхдээ энэ нь бодит ертөнцийн өгөгдлийн санд хэцүү зүйл бий болдог. Үнэндээ нэвтрүүлэх нь сайн сэргээгдсэн корпус юм. Яг ихэнхдээ Ханггеулд (Солонгосын бичил систем) өөр нэгэн бичил системтэй, олон төрлийн үг бичил хэлний (ООВ) хэлбэрээс гарч ирдэг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэлбэрийн эсрэг хүчирхэг хэлбэрүүдийг хадгалах үед хүчирхэг хэлбэрүүдийг санал болгож байна. Үүний санал болгон загвар нь анхны үгийг нэмэгдүүлэх архитектурыг ашигладаг. Өгөгдлийн хэлбэртэй загварын төлөвлөгөө нь хэлбэртэй, зөв үгсийн төлөвлөгөөтэй. Загвар өгсөн загварын үр дүнтэй байдлыг харуулахын тулд бид гурван төрлийн дотоод болон гадаад даалгавар хийдэг. Хэдийгээр суурь орших загварууд дуу түвшинд нэмэгддэг үед тогтвортой үйл ажиллагааг хадгалахгүй ч, санал өгсөн загвар нь тогтвортой үйл ажиллагааг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Tekstinnbygging vert kalla som ein grunnleggjande faktor for å forbetra utviklinga av ulike naturspråk- handsamingsmodeller (NLP). Det er imidlertid vanskeleg tilgjengeleg i datasett for verkeleg verda som ordinnbygging er generelt studiert med ein godt refinert korpus. I Hangeul (Koreansk skrivesystemet), som har eit unikt skrivesystemet, viser ulike typar ut- av- ordbokstavar (OOV) frå typar. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein robust Hangeul- ordinnbyggingsmodell mot typar, medan vi held høg utvikling. Det foreslåde modellet brukar ein konvolusjonell neuralnettverk (CNN) - arkitektur med ein kanal- oppmerkingsmekanismekanismekanismekanismekanismen som lærer å minne den opprinnelige ordinnbygginga. Modelltogen med eit datasett som inneheld ein mix av typar og korrekte ord. For å demonstrere effektiviteten av den foreslåde modellen, gjer vi tre typar innebygde og ekstrinske oppgåver. Selv om dei eksisterande innbyggingsmodelane ikkje kan vedlikehalde stabile utviklingar når støynivået aukar, viser det foreslåtte modellen stabil utvikling.', 'pl': 'Wkładanie tekstów jest uważane za istotny czynnik poprawy wydajności różnych modeli przetwarzania języka naturalnego (NLP). Jednak nie ma ona zastosowania w rzeczywistych zbiorach danych, ponieważ osadzanie słów jest ogólnie badane z dobrze dopracowanym korpusem. Szczególnie w Hangeul (koreański system pisania), który ma unikalny system pisania, różnego rodzaju poza słownictwem (OOV) pojawiają się z literów. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy solidny model osadzania słowa Hangeul przeciwko literówkom, przy jednoczesnym zachowaniu wysokiej wydajności. Proponowany model wykorzystuje architekturę Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) z mechanizmem uwagi kanału, który uczy się wnioskować oryginalne osadzenia słów. Model pociągu z zestawem danych, który składa się z mieszanki literów i poprawnych słów. Aby wykazać skuteczność proponowanego modelu, wykonujemy trzy rodzaje zadań wewnętrznych i zewnętrznych. Podczas gdy istniejące modele osadzania nie utrzymują stabilnej wydajności wraz ze wzrostem poziomu hałasu, proponowany model wykazuje stabilną wydajność.', 'ro': 'Integrarea cuvintelor este considerată un factor esențial în îmbunătățirea performanței diferitelor modele de procesare a limbajului natural (PNL). Cu toate acestea, este greu de aplicat în seturile de date din lumea reală, deoarece încorporarea cuvintelor este studiată în general cu un corpus bine rafinat. În special, în Hangeul (sistem de scriere coreeană), care are un sistem unic de scriere, diferite tipuri de Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) apar din greșeli de tastare. În această lucrare, propunem un model robust de încorporare a cuvintelor Hangeul împotriva greșelilor de scriere, menținând în același timp performanțe ridicate. Modelul propus utilizează o arhitectură de Rețea Neurală Convoluțională (CNN) cu un mecanism de atenție al canalului care învață să deducă încorporarea cuvântului original. Modelul tren cu un set de date care constă într-un amestec de greșeli de scriere și cuvinte corecte. Pentru a demonstra eficiența modelului propus, efectuăm trei tipuri de sarcini intrinsece și extrinsice. În timp ce modelele de încorporare existente nu reușesc să mențină performanțe stabile pe măsură ce nivelul de zgomot crește, modelul propus prezintă performanțe stabile.', 'si': 'වචන සංවිධානය විවිධ භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපනය (NLP) මොඩේල්ස් විසින් විසින් විසින් ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපනය ව නමුත්, ඒක ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ දත්ත සෙට්ටුවට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න බැරි වෙන්නේ වචන සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම හොඳ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරුප අනිවාර්යෙන්ම, හැන්ගුල් වල (කෝරියානු ලියන පද්ධතිය) වලින් විශේෂ ලියන පද්ධතියක් තියෙනවා, විවිධ වර්තන වර්තනයක මේ පැත්තට, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හැන්ගුල් වචනයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විරුද්ධවෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තිය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු මොඩේලය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය (CNN) සංවිධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා සඳහා  දත්ත සෙට් එක්ක මොඩේල් ක්\u200dරේන්ස් එක්ක වර්ගයක් සහ හරියට වචන වර්ගයක් තියෙන්නේ. ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු මොඩල් එකේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තුනක් විදියට සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා. ස්ථිර විදියට ස්ථිර විදියට තියාගන්න බැරි වුනොත්, ස්ථිර විදියට ස්ථිර විදියට විශාල විදියට, ප්\u200dර', 'sr': 'Uključenje reči smatra se ključnim faktorom za poboljšanje učinka različitih modela procesa prirodnog jezika (NLP). Međutim, teško da se primjenjuje u podacima realnog svijeta, jer se obično proučava sa dobro refinansiranom korpusom. Naravno, u Hangeul (Korejski pisaćni sistem), koji ima jedinstven pisaćni sistem, različite vrste izjave riječi (OOV) se pojavljuju iz tipova. U ovom papiru predlažemo snažnu Hangeul reč, uključujući model protiv tipa, dok održavamo visoke funkcije. Predloženi model koristi konvolucionalnu neuronsku mrežu (CNN) arhitekturu sa mehanizam pažnje kanala koji nauèi da inficira originalne reèi. Modelni vlak sa setom podataka koji se sastoji od mješavine tipa i ispravnih reči. Da bismo pokazali učinkovitost predloženog modela, obavljamo tri vrste unutrašnjih i ekstrintičnih zadataka. Iako postojeći modeli uključenih ne održavaju stabilne funkcije dok se nivo buke povećava, predloženi model pokazuje stabilne funkcije.', 'so': 'Ereyda ku socoshada waxaa looga xisaabiyaa sabab muhiim ah in uu horumariyo sameynta qaabilaada afka kala duduwan ee asalka ah (NLP). Si kastaba ha ahaatee si adag looma codsan karo sawirada caalamiga ah, sababtoo ah ereyga ku qoran waa lagu baraa korpus aad u sawiray. Notably, in Hangeul (Korean writing system), which has a unique writing system, various kinds of Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) appear from typos.  Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa hadal Hangeul oo ku qoran tusaale ka gees ah tusaale ahaan, marka aan sii hayno tababar dheer. Tusaale la soo jeeday wuxuu isticmaalaa taariikhda Neural Network (CNN) oo leh kanal attention mechanism, kaas oo baranaya in ay ku fekero hadalka asalka ah ee ku qoran. Tareenka midibka ah oo ku jira saxda macluumaadka, kaasoo ku jira isku xiran noocyo iyo hadalo saxda ah. Si aan u muujinno effektada modellka la soo jeeday, waxaan sameynaa saddex nooc oo ka mid ah shaqada gudaha iyo dibadda. Inta lagu jiro samooyin daboolka ah oo aan awoodin inay sii socoto tababar adag marka heerka codka la kordhiyo, waxaa muuqata qaababka la soo jeeday inuu sameeyo tababar adag.', 'sv': 'Ordinbäddning anses vara en viktig faktor för att förbättra prestanda för olika Natural Language Processing (NLP) modeller. Det är dock knappast tillämpligt i verkliga datauppsättningar eftersom ordinbäddning i allmänhet studeras med en väl förfinad korpus. I Hangeul (koreansk skrivsystem), som har ett unikt skrivsystem, visas olika typer av Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) från skrivfel. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en robust Hangeul-ordinbäddningsmodell mot skrivfel, samtidigt som hög prestanda bibehålls. Den föreslagna modellen använder en Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) arkitektur med en kanaluppmärksamhetsmekanism som lär sig att härleda det ursprungliga ordet inbäddningar. Modelltåget har en datauppsättning som består av en blandning av stavfel och korrekta ord. För att visa hur effektiv den föreslagna modellen är genomför vi tre typer av inre och yttre uppgifter. Även om befintliga inbäddningsmodeller misslyckas med att upprätthålla stabil prestanda när bullernivån ökar, visar den föreslagna modellen stabil prestanda.', 'ur': 'Word embedding is considered an essential factor in improving the performance of various Natural Language Processing (NLP) models. However, it is hardly applicable in real-world data sets as word embedding is generally studied with a well-refined corpus. یقیناً ہنگئل (کوریا لکھنے سیسٹم) میں، جس کے پاس ایک واحد لکھنے سیسٹم ہے، مختلف طریقے لکھنے والی (OOV) ٹائپوں سے ظاہر ہوتے ہیں۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک سخت ہنگئل لفظ کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو ٹیپوس کے خلاف مہربانی کی مدل کرتی ہے، جب تک عملکرد کی حفاظت کرتی ہے۔ پیشنهاد کی موڈل ایک کانرول نیورل نیٹورک (CNN) معماری مکانیسم کے ساتھ استعمال کرتا ہے جو اصلی لغات انبودینگ کے ذریعہ سیکھتا ہے. مدل ٹرین ایک ڈیٹ سٹ کے ساتھ ہے جو ٹیپوس اور درست کلمات میں ملتی ہے. پیشنهاد کی مدل کے مثبت کو دکھانے کے لئے ہم تین طرح کے داخلی اور خارجی کام کرتے ہیں۔ حاﻻنکہ موجود مڈیلڈ مڈیلڈ ثابت قدم رہنے کے لئے ناکام ہوتے ہیں جب صوت سطح زیادہ ہوتا ہے، پیشنهاد مدل ثابت قدم رہنے والی عملکرد کو دکھاتا ہے.', 'ta': 'Word embedding is considered an essential factor in improving the performance of various Natural Language Processing (NLP) models.  ஆனால், இது உண்மையான உலக தரவுத்தளங்களில் குறைவாக பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது எனினும் சொல்லை உள்ளடக்கம் பொதுவாக சுருக்கப்பட்ட க குறிப்பிட்டு, ஹாங்கியூல் (கொரிய எழுதும் முறைமையில்) ஒரு தனிப்பட்ட எழுதும் முறைமையில், பல வகையான வெளியேற்ற சொல்வளங்கள் (OOV)  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஹாங்கியூல் சொல்லை மாதிரியான முறைமையை தேர்வு செய்யும் போது, அதிக செயல்பாட்டை பாத The proposed model uses a Convolution Neural Network (CNN) architecture with a channel attention mechanism that teaches to infect the original word embeddings. Name திருத்தப்பட்ட மாதிரியின் விளைவை காட்ட வேண்டுமானால், நாம் மூன்று வகையான உள்ளடக்கம் மற்றும் வெளியேற்றும இருக்கும் உள்ளடக்க மாதிரிகள் ஒலி நிலை அதிகரிக்கும் போது நிலையான செயல்பாட்டை பாதுகாக்க இயலவில்லை என்றால், பரிந்த', 'vi': 'Từ ngữ được xem là một yếu tố cần thiết để nâng cao khả năng sản xuất của các mô hình ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (NIchọc) khác nhau. Tuy nhiên, nó hầu như không thể tồn tại trong các nhà dữ liệu thế giới thực vì từ ngữ được nghiên cứu chung với một tập đoàn tinh tế. Đánh dấu bằng chữ Hangeul (chế độ viết Hàn Quốc) có một hệ thống viết độc đáo, nhiều loại từ loại ngoài ngôn ngữ (OOOV) xuất hiện từ các loại khác nhau. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình dán chữ Hangeul mạnh mẽ để khắc phục các lỗi máy, nhưng vẫn giữ hiệu suất cao. Người mẫu đã đề nghị sử dụng cấu trúc thần kinh xuyên tâm linh (CNN) với một cơ chế tập trung kênh có thể học kết luận sự nhúng vào từ gốc. The model train with a dataset that consist of a mix of types và freed words. Để chứng minh hiệu quả của mô hình đề xuất, chúng tôi thực hiện ba loại công việc riêng biệt và dứt khoát. Trong khi các mô-đun tổ hợp tồn tại không thể duy trì hiệu suất ổn định khi mức độ ồn ào tăng lên, mẫu đề nghị cho thấy hiệu suất ổn định.', 'uz': "Name Lekin bu dunyo haqiqida maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi qoʻllanmagan emas, chunki so'zning ichki soʻz umuman yaxshi o'zgartirilgan corpus bilan o'rganadi. Diqqat, Hangeul (Koreya yozuvchi tizimda uning yozuvchi tizimi bor, OOV turlaridan turli turli turlaridan koʻrinadi. Bu qogʻozda, biz turli modellardan foydalanadigan Hangeul so'zni boshqarishni talab qilamiz, va yuqori ishni davom etishda. Name Name Ko'rsatilgan modelning effektini ko'rsatish uchun biz uch turli ichki va cheksiz vazifalarni bajaramiz. Name", 'bg': 'Вградването на думи се счита за съществен фактор за подобряване на ефективността на различни модели за обработка на естествен език (НЛП). Въпреки това, тя едва ли е приложима в реалните набори от данни, тъй като вграждането на думи обикновено се изучава с добре усъвършенстван корпус. По-специално, в корейската система за писане, която има уникална система за писане, различни видове Извън речник (ОВ) се появяват от печатни грешки. В тази статия предлагаме здрав модел за вграждане на думи срещу печатни грешки, като същевременно поддържаме висока производителност. Предложеният модел използва архитектура на конвелуционната неврална мрежа (CNN) с механизъм за внимание на канала, който се научава да прави изводи на оригиналните вграждания на думи. Моделът влак с набор от данни, който се състои от смесица от печатни грешки и правилни думи. За да демонстрираме ефективността на предлагания модел, провеждаме три вида вътрешни и външни задачи. Докато съществуващите вградени модели не успяват да поддържат стабилна производителност с увеличаване на нивото на шума, предложеният модел показва стабилна производителност.', 'nl': 'Woordinbedding wordt beschouwd als een essentiële factor bij het verbeteren van de prestaties van verschillende Natural Language Processing (NLP)-modellen. Het is echter nauwelijks toepasbaar in real-world datasets aangezien woord embedding over het algemeen wordt bestudeerd met een goed verfijnd corpus. Met name in Hangeul (Koreaans schrijfsysteem), dat een uniek schrijfsysteem heeft, verschijnen verschillende soorten Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) uit typefouten. In dit artikel stellen we een robuust Hangeul woord embedding model voor tegen typefouten, met behoud van hoge prestaties. Het voorgestelde model maakt gebruik van een Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) architectuur met een channel attention mechanisme dat leert om de oorspronkelijke woord embeddings af te leiden. De modeltrain met een dataset die bestaat uit een mix van typefouten en correcte woorden. Om de effectiviteit van het voorgestelde model aan te tonen, voeren we drie soorten intrinsieke en extrinsieke taken uit. Hoewel de bestaande inbeddingsmodellen geen stabiele prestaties handhaven naarmate het geluidsniveau toeneemt, toont het voorgestelde model stabiele prestaties.', 'hr': 'Uključenje riječi smatra se ključnim faktorom u poboljšanju učinka različitih modela procesa prirodnog jezika (NLP). Međutim, teško je primjenjivati u podacima realnog svijeta jer se obično ispitiva dobar refinancirani korpus. Naročito, u Hangeul (Korejski pisaćem sustavu), koji ima jedinstven pisaćeg sustava, različite vrste izjave riječi (OOV) se pojavljuju iz tipa. U ovom papiru predlažemo snažnu Hangeul riječ uključujući model protiv tipa, dok održavamo visoke funkcije. Predloženi model koristi konvolucionalnu neuronsku mrežu (CNN) arhitekturu s mehanizam pažnje kanala koji nauči da inficira originalne riječi ugrađenje. Modelni vlak sa setom podataka koji se sastoji od mješavine tipa i ispravnih riječi. Da bismo pokazali učinkovitost predloženog modela, provodili smo tri vrste unutrašnjih i ekstrintičnih zadataka. Iako postojeći uključujući modeli ne održavaju stabilne funkcije dok se razina zvuka povećava, predloženi model pokazuje stabilne funkcije.', 'da': 'Word integrering betragtes som en væsentlig faktor for at forbedre ydeevnen af forskellige Natural Language Processing (NLP) modeller. Men det er næppe anvendeligt i virkelige datasæt, da ordindlejring generelt studeres med et velraffineret korpus. Især i Hangeul (koreansk skrivesystem), som har et unikt skrivesystem, vises forskellige former for Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) fra skrivefejl. I denne artikel foreslår vi en robust Hangeul ordindlejringsmodel mod stavefejl, samtidig med at den opretholder høj ydeevne. Den foreslåede model bruger en Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) arkitektur med en kanal opmærksomhedsmekanisme, der lærer at udlede det oprindelige ord embeddings. Modellen tog med et datasæt, der består af en blanding af stavefejl og korrekte ord. For at demonstrere effektiviteten af den foreslåede model udfører vi tre slags iboende og eksterne opgaver. Mens de eksisterende integreringsmodeller ikke kan opretholde stabil ydeevne, efterhånden som støjniveauet stiger, viser den foreslåede model stabil ydeevne.', 'de': 'Die Einbettung von Wörtern wird als wesentlicher Faktor für die Verbesserung der Leistung verschiedener Natural Language Processing (NLP)-Modelle angesehen. Allerdings ist es in realen Datensätzen kaum anwendbar, da Worteinbettung in der Regel mit einem gut verfeinerten Korpus studiert wird. Bemerkenswert ist, dass in Hangeul (koreanisches Schriftsystem), das ein einzigartiges Schriftsystem hat, verschiedene Arten von Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) durch Tippfehler auftreten. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein robustes Hangeul-Wort-Einbettungsmodell vor, das Tippfehler verhindert und gleichzeitig hohe Leistung beibehält. Das vorgeschlagene Modell verwendet eine Convolutional Neural Network (CNN)-Architektur mit einem Kanalaufmerksamkeitsmechanismus, der lernt, die ursprünglichen Worteinbettungen zu schließen. Der Modellzug mit einem Datensatz, der aus einer Mischung aus Tippfehlern und korrekten Wörtern besteht. Um die Wirksamkeit des vorgeschlagenen Modells zu demonstrieren, führen wir drei Arten von intrinsischen und extrinsischen Aufgaben durch. Während die vorhandenen Einbettungsmodelle bei steigendem Geräuschpegel keine stabile Leistung beibehalten, zeigt das vorgeschlagene Modell eine stabile Leistung.', 'id': 'Pencampuran kata dianggap faktor penting untuk meningkatkan prestasi dari berbagai model Proses Bahasa Alami (NLP). Namun, itu tidak dapat diterapkan dalam set data dunia nyata karena penyembedding kata biasanya dipelajari dengan mayat yang baik. Terutama, di Hangeul (sistem tulisan Korea), yang memiliki sistem tulisan unik, berbagai jenis Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) muncul dari tipos. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan sebuah kata Hangeul yang kuat memasukkan model melawan tipo, sementara mempertahankan prestasi tinggi. The proposed model utilizes a Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) architecture with a channel attention mechanism that learns to infer the original word embeddings.  Kereta model dengan set data yang terdiri dari campuran tipos dan kata yang benar. Untuk menunjukkan efektivitas model yang diusulkan, kami melakukan tiga jenis tugas intrinsik dan ekstrinsik. Sementara model embedding yang ada gagal mempertahankan prestasi stabil saat tingkat suara meningkat, model yang diusulkan menunjukkan prestasi stabil.', 'ko': '단어 삽입은 다양한 자연 언어 처리(NLP) 모델의 성능을 향상시키는 관건적인 요소로 여겨진다.그러나 이것은 현실 세계의 데이터 집합에 거의 적용되지 않는다. 왜냐하면 단어 삽입은 보통 완벽한 어료 라이브러리를 통해 연구되기 때문이다.주의해야 할 것은 한국어 쓰기 시스템(Hangul, Korean writing system, 한국어 쓰기 시스템)에서 맞춤법 오류로 다양한 어휘표 밖(Out-of-wordary, OOV)이 나타났다는 점이다.본고에서 우리는 고성능을 유지하면서 맞춤법 오류를 방지할 수 있는 건장한 한글 단어 삽입 모델을 제시했다.이 모델은 볼륨신경망(CNN) 구조와 통로 주의 메커니즘을 활용해 원시 단어의 삽입을 추정하는 것을 배운다.이 모델은 맞춤법 오류와 정확한 단어로 구성된 데이터 집합을 사용하여 훈련한다.이 모델의 유효성을 증명하기 위해 우리는 세 가지 내재와 외재 임무를 진행했다.기존의 삽입 모델은 소음 수준이 증가함에 따라 안정적인 성능을 유지할 수 없지만 제시된 모델은 안정적인 성능을 보여준다.', 'fa': 'جمع کردن کلمات به عنوان یک faktor ضروری در improving the performance of various Natural Language Processing (NLP) models consider embedding is an essential factor in improving the performance of different languages Processing (NLP). با این حال، به سختی در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای دنیای واقعی قابل استفاده نمی\u200cشود، به عنوان کلمه\u200cای که در کلمه\u200cای وارد می\u200cشود، معمولاً با یک مجموعه بسیار پاکیزه\u200cشده تحقیق می\u200cشود. مخصوصاً در هنگول (سیستم نوشتن کره) که یک سیستم نوشتن متفاوتی دارد، نوع\u200cهای مختلف از کلمات بیرون (OOV) از نوشته\u200cها ظاهر می\u200cشوند. در این کاغذ، ما یک کلمه سخت هانگئول را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که در حالی که عملکرد بالا حفظ می\u200cکند، در مقابل مدل قابل توجه می\u200cکند. این مدل پیشنهاد یک معماری شبکه عصبی (CNN) را با یک مکانیسم توجه کانال استفاده می\u200cکند که یاد می\u200cگیرد که کلمه اصلی را وارد کنند. قطار مدل با مجموعه داده ای که از یک ترکیب نوع و کلمات درست وجود دارد. برای نشان دادن فعالیت مدل پیشنهاد، ما سه نوع کار داخلی و خارجی را انجام می دهیم. در حالی که مدل\u200cهای پیدا کردن موجود در حالی که سطح صدا افزایش می\u200cکند، قابلیت استواری را نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Kuingia kwa neno linachukuliwa kuwa ni sababu muhimu katika kuboresha utendaji wa mifano mbalimbali ya Utarabu wa Lugha (NLP). Hata hivyo, si vigumu kutumika katika seti za taarifa halisi duniani kwa kuwa maneno yanayotumika kwa ujumla yanasomwa kwa vizuri. Kwa hakika, jijini Hangeul (mfumo wa kuandika nchini Korea), ambao una mfumo wa kuandika wa kipekee, a in a mbalimbali za Utoaji wa Kireno (OOV) unaonekana kutoka katika aina mbalimbali. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza neno la Hangeul linalozungumzia mifano dhidi ya aina hii, wakati tunaendelea kufanya kazi kubwa. Mfano huu unapendekezwa hutumia ujenzi wa Mtandao wa Neural (CNN) unaoandika na mfumo wa kusikiliza mkononi ambao unajifunza kuathiri maneno ya asili yanayoingizwa. treni ya model yenye seti ya data inayojumuisha mchanganyiko wa aina na maneno sahihi. Ili kuonyesha ufanisi wa muundo huo unapendekezwa, tunafanya kazi tatu za ndani na nje. Wakati mifano ya kuwepo imeshindwa kuendelea utendaji wenye msimamo mkali wakati sauti zinazoongezeka, mtindo huu unapendekezwa unaonyesha utendaji wa utulivu.', 'af': "Woord inbetering is aangesien 'n nuwe faktor in die verbetering van die prestasie van verskeie Natuurlike Taal Prosessering (NLP) modele. Maar, dit is skaars toewenbaar in werklike wêreld datastelle as woord inbêring is algemeen ondersoek met 'n goed opgewerp korpus. Notief, in Hangeul (Koreaanse skryfstelsel), wat het 'n unieke skryfstelsel, verskillende soorte van uit- van- woorde (OOV) verskyn van tipes. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n kragtige Hangeul woord inbetering model teen tipes, terwyl hoog prestasie onderhou. Die voorgestelde model gebruik 'n Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) architektur met 'n kanaal aandag mekanisme wat leer om die oorspronklike woord inbettings te infeer. Die model trein met 'n datastel wat bestaan van 'n gemink van tipes en korrekte woorde. Om die effektiviteit van die voorgestelde model te wys, het ons drie soorte intrinsiese en extrinsic taak gedoen. Alhoewel die bestaande inbinneste modele misluk om stabile prestasie te hou as die geluidvlak vergroei word, vertoon die voorgestelde model stabile prestasie.", 'sq': 'Përfshirja e fjalëve konsiderohet një faktor thelbësor në përmirësimin e performancës së modeleve të ndryshme të Procesimit të Gjuhave Natyrore (NLP). Megjithatë, ajo nuk është e aplikueshme në grupet e të dhënave të botës reale, pasi përdorimi i fjalëve është studiuar përgjithësisht me një trup të rafinuar mirë. Në mënyrë të veçantë, në Hangeul (sistemin korean të shkrimit), i cili ka një sistem unik shkrimi, lloje të ndryshme jashtë fjalëkalimit (OOV) duken nga tipat. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një fjalë të fortë Hangeul që të përfshijë modelin kundër tipave, duke mbajtur performancën e lartë. Modeli i propozuar përdor një arkitekturë të Rrjetit Neural Konveolutiv (CNN) me një mekanizëm vëmendjeje kanali që mëson të përfundojë përfshirjet origjinale të fjalëve. Treni model me një set të dhënash që përbëhet nga një përzierje tipash dhe fjalësh të sakta. Për të demonstruar efektshmërinë e modelit të propozuar, ne kryejmë tre lloje detyrash brenda dhe jashtë. Ndërsa modelet ekzistuese të përfshirjes nuk mbajnë performancë të qëndrueshme ndërsa niveli i zhurmës rritet, modeli i propozuar tregon performancë të qëndrueshme.', 'tr': 'Metin ga첵힊artmak d체rli Batyr dil i힊le첵i힊i (NLP) nusgalaryny흫 t채zeliklerini bejermek 체챌in esasy faktor di첵ip kabul edil첵채r. 횦철ne, d체n첵채de maglumat setirlerinde bu s철z da힊ary edilen 첵agda첵da has gowy ta첵첵arlanan korpus bilen okanan 첵aly kyn챌ylyk d채ldir. Adat챌a, Hangeul (K철re챌e 첵azma sistemasynda), i챌inde birn채챌e 첵azma sistemasy bar, birn채챌e 챌e힊itli s철zleri "Out-of-Vocabulary" (OOV) t체rlerden g철r체n첵채r. Bu kagyzda 첵okary ta첵첵arlanan hasaplanjak 체챌in g체첵챌li bir Hangeul s철z nusgasyny teklip ed첵채ris. Mazmunlar nusgasy 철z ba힊langy챌 s철zleri girdirmek 체챌in 철wren첵채n kanal 체ns me첵dan챌asyny 체챌in bir nusgasyny ulan첵ar. Ber체vler takyky bilen modal otly tipler we dogry s철zler bar. 횜nerleven nusgany흫 etkinligini g철rkezmek 체챌in 체챌 n채hili i챌eri we 챌채r채k i힊i 첵erine 첵etirdik. H채zirki bar nusgalar g체rr체흫 derejesi 첵okarynda stabiliz ukyplary gorama첵ardy, nusgasy 챌yky힊 edip duran ukyplary g철rkez첵채r.', 'hy': 'Բառերի ներառումը համարվում է կարևոր գործոն տարբեր բնական լեզվի մշակույթի (ՆԼՊ) գործողությունների բարելավման համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, այն հազիվ կիրառվում է իրական աշխարհի տվյալների համակարգերում, քանի որ բառերի ներգրավումը սովորաբար ուսումնասիրում է լավ վերլուծված մարմնով: Notably, in Hangeul (Korean writing system), which has a unique writing system, various kinds of Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) appear from typos.  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք ուժեղ Հանգեուլ բառ, որը ներառում է մոդել տիպերի դեմ, մինչդեռ պահպանում է բարձր արտադրողականությունը: Առաջարկված մոդելը օգտագործում է Կենտրոնական Նյարդային ցանցի (CNN) ճարտարապետություն, որը ունի կանանցի ուշադրության մեխանիզմ, որը սովորում է եզրակացնել սկզբնական բառերի ներդրումը: Մոդելը գնում է տվյալների համակարգով, որը կազմում է տիպերի և ճիշտ բառերի խառնուրդ: Որպեսզի ապացուցենք նախագծված մոդելի արդյունավետությունը, մենք կատարում ենք երեք տեսակի ներքին և արտաքին առաջադրանքներ: Մինչդեռ գոյություն ունեցող ներդրման մոդելները չեն կարողանում պահպանել կայուն արդյունավետությունը, մինչ աղմուկի մակարդակը բարձրանում է, առաջարկված մոդելը ցույց է տալիս կայուն արդյունավետու', 'am': 'የቃላት አቀማመጥ የጥያቄ ቋንቋ ፕሮጀክት (NLP) ሞዴላዎችን ለማድረግ የዋጋ ጉዳይ ሆኗል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን በአዳራዊ ሀብት ዳታተሮች ውስጥ ቢጠቀሙ ቃላት በጠቅላላ በክሮፕስ ተማርቷል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ በሀንጋኡል (የቆሬ ጽሑፍ ሲስተም) የተለየ የጽሑፍ ጽሑፍ ስርዓት ያለበት፣ የዓይነት ዓይነቶች የውጭ-out-of-Vocabulary (OOV) ከዓይነቶች ይታያል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ከፍ ከፍ ከፍ አድራጊውን በመጠበቅ የሐንጉኤል ቃላት በዓይነቶች ላይ የተሰናከረውን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ሞዴል የፊደል ቃላትን ለማሳደግ የሚማር የኮንፕሎጂ ነዌር መረብ (CNN) መሠረት ማድረግ ነው፡፡ በዓይነት በተለያዩ እና ቃላትን የሚያስተካክሉ የዳታ setet የሞዴል train የተዘጋጀውን የሞዴል ጥቅም ለማሳየት፣ ሦስት ዓይነት የውስጥና የውጭ ስራ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የአሁኑ የድምፅ ደረጃ ሲያበዛ የድምፅ አካባቢ ሞዴል ሲያደላደል፣ በተዘጋጀው ሞዴል የደግሞውን ድጋፍ ያሳያል፡፡', 'bn': 'বিভিন্ন প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়া (এনএলপি) মডেলের প্রক্রিয়া উন্নতি করার জন্য শব্দ বিভিন্ন গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কারণ হি তবে এটা বাস্তব বিশ্বের ডাটাসেটে প্রয়োজনীয় নয় যেহেতু শব্দ বিভিন্ন সাধারণত ভালো সংশোধনী কর্পুস দ্বারা পড়া হয়। উল্লেখযোগ্য হ্যাঙ্গিউল (কোরিয়ার লেখা সিস্টেম) যেখানে একটি অনন্য লেখা সিস্টেম আছে, বিভিন্ন ধরনের বিভিন্ন ধরনের অফ-অফ শব্ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা হ্যাঙ্গিউল শব্দের প্রস্তাব করি টাইপোসের বিরুদ্ধে মডেলের বিরুদ্ধে প্রযোজ্য, যখন উচ্চ প্রদর্শন প্রস্তাবিত মডেল কনভোলেশন নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক (সিএনএন) স্থাপত্য ব্যবহার করে একটি চ্যানেলের মনোযোগের মাধ্যমে একটি চ্যানেলের মনোযোগের মাধ্ একটি ডাটাসেটের মোডেল ট্রেন যার মধ্যে টাইপ এবং সঠিক শব্দ রয়েছে। প্রস্তাবিত মডেলের কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শনের জন্য আমরা তিনটি ধরনের অভ্যন্তরীণ এবং বিদেশী কাজ করি। যদিও বিদ্যমান বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক মডেল স্থায়ীভাবে প্রকাশ করতে ব্যর্থ হয়েছে যেহেতু শব্দের স্তর বৃদ্ধি হয়েছে, তখন প্রস্তা', 'az': 'Sözləri içərisində daxil edilən növbənöv Təbiq Dil İşləməsi (NLP) modellərinin performansını yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün əsas faktör hesab edilir. Lakin bu, həqiqət dünya verilənlərində çox yaxşı təmizlənmiş bir korpus vasitəsilə təhsil edilir. Əlbəttə, Hangeul (Koreyalı yazıb sistemində), kimisi yazıb sistemi var, kimisi sözlərin "Out of Vocabulary" (OOV) türü tiplərdən görünür. Bu kağızda, yüksək performansı qorumaq üçün çox qüvvətli Hangeul sözünü təklif edirik. Önüllü modellər mənbəzi sözləri inkişaf etmək üçün öyrənən kanal dikkati mehanizmi ilə Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) arhitektürünü istifadə edir. Model məlumat quruluğu ilə birləşdirilmiş tiplərdən və düzgün sözlərdən olub. Önülləşdirilmiş modelin etkinliğini göstərmək üçün, üç türlü içəri və ekstrinsici işlər işlədik. Mevcut modellər səs seviyyəsi artırdığı kimi stabil performansı qorumaq bacarılmadığı halda, bu modellər stabil performansı göstərir.', 'ca': 'Word embedding is considered an essential factor in improving the performance of various Natural Language Processing (NLP) models.  No obstant això, gairebé no es aplica als conjunts de dades del món real, perquè l\'incorporació de paraules es estudia generalment amb un cos ben refinat. En especial, a Hangeul (sistema d\'escriptura coreana), que té un sistema d\'escriptura únic, apareixen diversos tipus de "Out-Of-Vocabulary" (OOV) dels tipus. En aquest article, proposem un robust model Hangeul d\'incorporació de paraules contra els tipus, mentre mantenim un alt rendiment. El model proposat utilitza una arquitectura Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) amb un mecanisme d\'atenció del canal que aprenen a deduir l\'incorporació de paraules originals. The model train with a dataset that consists of a mix of typos and correct words.  Per demostrar l\'eficacia del model proposat, fem tres tipus de tasques intrínsecs i extrínses. Mentre que els models d\'integració existents no mantenen un rendiment estable a mesura que el nivell de soroll augmenta, el model proposat mostra un rendiment estable.', 'cs': 'Vložení slov je považováno za základní faktor pro zlepšení výkonnosti různých modelů zpracování přirozeného jazyka (NLP). V reálných datových sadách však není aplikovatelný, protože vkládání slov je obecně studováno s dobře rafinovaným korpusem. Především v Hangeul (korejský psací systém), který má unikátní psací systém, se z překlepů objevují různé druhy mimo slovní zásobu (OOV). V tomto článku navrhujeme robustní model vložení slov Hangeul proti překlepům, při zachování vysokého výkonu. Navržený model využívá architekturu Convolucionální neuronové sítě (CNN) s mechanismem pozornosti kanálu, který se naučí odvozovat původní vložení slov. Model vlaku s datovou sadou, která se skládá ze směsi překlepů a správných slov. Pro demonstraci efektivity navrženého modelu provádíme tři druhy intrinsických a extrinsických úkolů. Zatímco stávající modely vkládání nedokážou udržet stabilní výkon s rostoucí hladinou hluku, navrhovaný model vykazuje stabilní výkon.', 'bs': 'Uključenje riječi smatra se ključnim faktorom u poboljšanju učinka različitih modela procesa prirodnog jezika (NLP). Međutim, teško je primjenjivati u podacima realnog svijeta jer se obično proučava sa dobro refinansiranom korpusom. Naravno, u Hangeul (Korejski pisaćem sustavu), koji ima jedinstven pisaćeg sustava, različite vrste izvan riječi (OOV) se pojavljuju iz tipova. U ovom papiru predlažemo snažnu Hangeul riječ, uključujući model protiv tipa, dok održavamo visoke funkcije. Predloženi model koristi konvolucionalnu neuronsku mrežu (CNN) arhitekturu sa mehanizam pažnje kanala koji nauči da inficira originalne rečenice. Modelni vlak sa setom podataka koji se sastoji od mješavine tipa i ispravnih riječi. Da bismo pokazali učinkovitost predloženog modela, obavljamo tri vrste unutrašnjih i ekstrintičnih zadataka. Iako postojeći modeli uključenih ne održavaju stabilne funkcije dok se nivo buke povećava, predloženi model pokazuje stabilne funkcije.', 'et': 'Sõnade manustamist peetakse oluliseks teguriks erinevate looduskeele töötlemise mudelite (NLP) jõudluse parandamisel. Kuid see ei ole pärismaailma andmekogumites vaevalt kohaldatav, kuna sõna manustamist uuritakse üldiselt hästi rafineeritud korpusega. Eriti Hangeul (Korea kirjutamissüsteem), millel on unikaalne kirjutamissüsteem, ilmuvad trükivigadest erinevad sõnavara (OOV) liiki. Käesolevas töös pakume välja tugeva Hangeuli sõna manustamise mudeli trükivigade vastu, säilitades samas kõrge jõudluse. Kavandatud mudel kasutab konvolutsioonilise neurovõrgu (CNN) arhitektuuri kanali tähelepanu mehhanismiga, mis õpib järeldama algseid sõnu manustamist. Mudelrong koosneb andmekogumist, mis koosneb trükivigade ja õigete sõnade segust. Kavandatud mudeli efektiivsuse demonstreerimiseks teostame kolme liiki sisemist ja välist ülesannet. Kuigi olemasolevad manustamismudelid ei suuda mürataseme tõusu tõttu säilitada stabiilset jõudlust, näitab kavandatud mudel stabiilset jõudlust.', 'fi': 'Tekstien upottamista pidetään olennaisena tekijänä erilaisten luonnollisen kielen käsittelymallien suorituskyvyn parantamisessa. Sitä ei kuitenkaan juurikaan voida soveltaa reaalimaailman aineistoihin, sillä sanaupotusta tutkitaan yleensä hyvin hienostuneella korpusella. Erityisesti Hangeulissa (korealainen kirjoitusjärjestelmä), jossa on ainutlaatuinen kirjoitusjärjestelmä, erilaiset Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) näkyvät kirjoitusvirheistä. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme vankkaa Hangeul-sanaupotusmallia kirjoitusvirheitä vastaan säilyttäen samalla korkean suorituskyvyn. Ehdotetussa mallissa hyödynnetään konvolutional neural Network (CNN) -arkkitehtuuria kanavan huomiomekanismilla, joka oppii päättelemään alkuperäisen sanan upotukset. Mallijuna koostuu kirjoitusvirheiden ja oikeiden sanojen yhdistelmästä. Esitetyn mallin tehokkuuden osoittamiseksi suoritamme kolmenlaisia sisäisiä ja ulkoisia tehtäviä. Vaikka nykyiset upotusmallit eivät pysty ylläpitämään vakaata suorituskykyä melutason noustessa, ehdotettu malli näyttää vakaan suorituskyvyn.', 'sk': 'Vključevanje besedil velja za bistven dejavnik pri izboljšanju učinkovitosti različnih modelov obdelave naravnega jezika (NLP). Vendar pa se v resničnih zbirkah podatkov težko uporablja, saj se vgradnja besed običajno preučuje z dobro izpopolnjenim korpusom. Zlasti v Hangeul (korejski pisalni sistem), ki ima edinstven pisalni sistem, se iz tipkarskih napak pojavijo različne vrste izven besedišča (OOV). V tem prispevku predlagamo robustni model vgradnje besed Hangeul proti tipkarskim napakam, hkrati pa ohranjamo visoko zmogljivost. Predlagani model uporablja arhitekturo konvolucionalnega živčnega omrežja (CNN) z mehanizmom pozornosti kanala, ki se nauči sklepati izvirne besede vdelave. Modelni vlak s podatkovnim naborom, ki je sestavljen iz mešanice tipkarskih napak in pravilnih besed. Da bi dokazali učinkovitost predlaganega modela, izvajamo tri vrste notranjih in zunanjih nalog. Medtem ko obstoječi vgradni modeli ne ohranjajo stabilne zmogljivosti, ko se raven hrupa povečuje, predlagani model kaže stabilno zmogljivost.', 'he': 'הכניסה של מילים נחשבת גורם חיוני לשיפור ביצועים של דוגמנים שונים של תהליך שפת טבעית (NLP). בכל אופן, זה בקושי מתאים במערכות נתונים בעולם האמיתי, כיוון שכתובת מילים בדרך כלל לומדת עם גוף מעודן היטב. במיוחד, בהנגאול (מערכת כתיבה קוריאנית), שיש לה מערכת כתיבה ייחודית, סוגים שונים של מחוץ למילים (OOV) מופיעים מטיפוסים. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מודל מוצץ של מילה הונגאול נגד טיפוסים, בזמן שמירה ביצועים גבוהים. המודל המוצע משתמש בארכיטקטורה של רשת נוירולית משתנה (CNN) עם מנגנון תשומת לב ערוץ שמלמד להוציא את המילים המקוריות. הרכבת המודל עם קבוצת נתונים שמכילה מעורבת של טיפוסים ומילים נכונות. כדי להוכיח את היעילות של המודל המוצע, אנחנו מבצעים שלושה סוגים של משימות פנימיות וחיצוניות. למרות שהדוגמנים הקיומים לא יכולים לשמור על ביצועים יציבים כשרמת הרעש מגבילה, המודל המוצע מראה ביצועים יציבים.', 'ha': "An ƙaddara maganar da aka shigar da shi wani abu na muhimu a wajen kyautata performance na misãlai masu Shirin Ayuka na Natural (NLP). A lokacin da, bã ya da amfani da shi a cikin database masu cikin duniya halinsa kamar an karanta magana mai embedded da wani nau'in da aka sayar da shi. A note, a cikin Hangeel (na tsarin rubũtun Korea), wanda yana da wani na'ura na rubũtãwa, masu nau'i-nau'in-Babba'a-Vowal (OOV) za'a bayyana daga nau'i. Ga wannan takardan, Munã goyyar da wani magana na Hangeulu wanda ke cikin shirin misalin wasu misãlai, a lokacin da za'a tsare fanikin sarki. The proposed model utilizes a Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) architecture with a channel attention mechanism that learns to infer the original word embeddings.  @ info: whatsthis Dõmin ya nuna aikin misalin da aka buƙata, sai mu yi aiki uku-nau'i na guda da bakwai. A lokacin da misãlai da ke ƙunsa da shi bai kasa tsare performance mai tabbatacce a lokacin da tsãwa za'a ƙara, motel wanda aka buƙata yana nuna gyare mai tabbatacce.", 'jv': 'cal-itip politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Yo wis ngerasakno, barêng-barêng, nêng hangeul (sistem batire Korea), sing wis mungkin oleh akeh pisan, siji kabèh akeh sistem Out-of-Vokabulari Awak dhéwé éntuk kuwi, ngêpêmulai model sing beraksi perbudhakan apa-perbudhakan, lan akeh basa sing bisa bantuan. Laptop" and "Desktop Genjer-genjer model sing nganggo dataset sing mlawak karo Tipe lan gambaran Mbok iso ngomong efekasi ning model sing dipoleh, kita lagi wis angkang telu koyo ngono nggawe barang kelas telu ngono nggawe barang dumadhi. Saying', 'bo': 'སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་བསྐྲུན་ནི་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་མི་འདྲ་བ་ལ་ཉེན་མཁན་རེད། ཡིན་ནའང་། འཛམ་གླིང་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ལས་ཀྱང་ཕལ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཏུ་བཅུག Notably, in Hangeul (Korean writing system), which has a unique writing system, various kinds of Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) appear from typos. འོག གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་རང་དབང་དྲ་བ་(CNN)སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་ལམ་ལ་སྟོན་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་ཤིག་སྤྱོད་བྱེད་འདོད ཆག་སྡུད་མ་འཁོར་གྱི་མེ་དཔྱད་དོན་གྱིས་དབྱེ་བ་དང་བདེན་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་ཚོགས་མཚུངས་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་དཔེ་ལ་གྱི་ནུས་སྤྲོད་གཟུགས་རིས་གསུམ་ཀྱི་བྱ་རིམ་འདི་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་ཡིན། གནས་ཡུལ་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་མཐུད་པའི་མིག་དཔེ་གཞི་སྒྲིག་ཀྱི་ལས་འཕགས་རིས་ལྟར་སྟོན་མི་ཐུབ་པ་བསྟུན་ན།'}
{'en': 'Exploiting Multimodal Reinforcement Learning for Simultaneous Machine Translation', 'ar': 'استغلال التعلم المعزز متعدد الوسائط للترجمة الآلية المتزامنة', 'fr': "Exploiter l'apprentissage par renforcement multimodal pour la traduction automatique simultanée", 'es': 'Aprovechamiento del aprendizaje por refuerzo multimodal para la traducción automática simultánea', 'zh': '因多模态化学同声传译', 'ja': '同時機械翻訳のためのマルチモーダル強化学習の活用', 'hi': 'एक साथ मशीन अनुवाद के लिए मल्टीमॉडल सुदृढीकरण सीखने का शोषण', 'ga': 'Leas a Bhaint as Foghlaim Neartú Ilmhódúil le haghaidh Aistriú Meaisín Comhuaineach', 'pt': 'Explorando o aprendizado por reforço multimodal para tradução automática simultânea', 'ru': 'Использование мультимодального обучения для одновременного машинного перевода', 'ka': 'Multimodal reinforcement Learning for Simultaneous Machine Translation', 'el': 'Αξιοποίηση της εκμάθησης πολυμέσων ενίσχυσης για την ταυτόχρονη μηχανική μετάφραση', 'hu': 'A multimodális megerősítési tanulás kihasználása az egyidejű gépi fordításhoz', 'it': "Sfruttare l'apprendimento multimodale di rinforzo per la traduzione automatica simultanea", 'lt': 'Daugiarūšio stiprinimo mokymosi vienu metu vertimo mašinomis naudojimas', 'kk': 'Қосымша машина аудармасының көптеген көптеген жақсарту оқытуы', 'mk': 'Користење на мултимедално засилување на учењето за симултанео преведување на машините', 'ms': 'Menggunakan Penolakan Pengesahan Multimodal untuk Terjemahan Mesin Simultan', 'mt': 'L-isfruttament tat-Tagħlim Multimodali ta’ Rinforz għat-Traduzzjoni Simultanja tal-Magni', 'no': 'Eksplosjon av multimodal stipringslæring for fleire maskinsomsetjingar', 'ml': 'ഒരേ സമയത്തെ മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷക്കുള്ള പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി പല മൊട്ടല്\u200d പുനര്\u200dത്ഥിപ്പിക്കുന്നു', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie multimodalnego uczenia się wzmacniającego do jednoczesnego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'ro': 'Exploatarea învățării multimodale de întărire pentru traducerea automată simultană', 'mn': 'Мөн олон загварын хөгжлийн суралцах үйл ажиллагаа', 'so': 'Waxbarashada dugsiga badan ee la turjumayo siman mashiinka', 'sv': 'Utnyttja multimodalt förstärkningslärande för simultan maskinöversättning', 'ta': 'ஒரே இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பிற்கு பல மாற்று தகவல் கற்றுக் கொடுக்கப்படுகிறது', 'sr': 'Eksplozirajući učenje multimodalnog pojačanja za simulaciju prevoda mašine', 'si': 'සමාන්\u200dය මැෂින් පරිවාදය සඳහා ගොඩක් මාධ්\u200dයමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරනවා', 'ur': 'Multimodal Reinforcement Learning for Simultaneous Machine Translation', 'vi': 'Bùng nổ Việc phát triển Tương truyền học cho máy móc đồng thời', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Използване на мултимодално обучение за подсилване за едновременен машинен превод', 'nl': 'Multimodale versterking leren benutten voor simultaane machinevertaling', 'hr': 'Eksplozirajući učenje multimodalnog pojačanja za istovremeno prevodenje strojeva', 'da': 'Udnyttelse af multimodal forstærkningslæring til samtidig maskinoversættelse', 'de': 'Multimodales Verstärkungslernen für die simultane maschinelle Übersetzung nutzen', 'id': 'Exploiting Multimodal Reinforcement Learning for Simultaneous Machine Translation', 'fa': 'توسعه یادگیری بیشترmodal reinforcement Learning for Simultaneous Machine Translation', 'ko': '다중모드를 이용하여 학습을 강화하여 기계번역을 진행하다', 'sw': 'Kutumia mafunzo mengi ya Kufundisha Kujifunza kwa Tafsiri ya Mashiniki moja kwa moja', 'tr': 'Çoklumodal Taýýarlama Maşynyň terjimesi üçin öwrenmek', 'sq': 'Shfrytëzimi i Mësimit të Përforcimit Multimodal për Traktatimin Simultan e Makinës', 'af': 'Verspreiding van Multimodale Versterking Leer vir Simuleerde Masjien Vertaling', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Միևնույն մեքենայի թարգմանման համար բազմամոդալ ուժեղացման սովորելը օգտագործելը', 'az': 'M칲xt톛lif Makin 칂evirm톛si 칲칞칲n 칞oxlu modal Y칲kselm톛 칐yr톛nm톛si', 'bn': 'একই সাথে মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য মাল্টিমোডাল পুনর্গঠন শিক্ষা প্রদান করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Eksplozirajući učenje multimodalnog pojačanja za istovremeno prevodenje mašine', 'ca': "Exploitar l'aprenentatge multimodal de reforç per traducció simultànea de màquines", 'cs': 'Využití multimodálního posilovacího učení pro simultánní strojový překlad', 'et': 'Multimodaalse tugevdusõppe kasutamine samaaegse masintõlke jaoks', 'fi': 'Multimodaalisen vahvistuksen oppimisen hyödyntäminen samanaikaiseen konekäännökseen', 'jv': 'Ngubah Isopo Multimodal Rayongkapa Jejaring kanggo Simultaneous Mas Terjamahan', 'he': 'ניצל את הלימודים של התחזקות רבות מודליות לתרגום מכונות באופן זמני', 'sk': 'Izkoriščanje večmodalnega učenja okrepitve za sočasno strojno prevajanje', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་མ་དངུལ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཕན་བསྐྱེད་ཚད་སླུང་བའི་ལག་འཁྱེར་ལ་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'This paper addresses the problem of simultaneous machine translation (SiMT) by exploring two main concepts : (a) adaptive policies to learn a good trade-off between high translation quality and low latency ; and (b) visual information to support this process by providing additional (visual) contextual information which may be available before the textual input is produced. For that, we propose a multimodal approach to simultaneous machine translation using reinforcement learning, with strategies to integrate visual and textual information in both the agent and the environment. We provide an exploration on how different types of visual information and integration strategies affect the quality and latency of simultaneous translation models, and demonstrate that visual cues lead to higher quality while keeping the latency low.', 'ar': 'تتناول هذه الورقة مشكلة الترجمة الآلية المتزامنة (SiMT) من خلال استكشاف مفهومين رئيسيين: (أ) السياسات التكيفية لتعلم المقايضة الجيدة بين جودة الترجمة العالية والكمون المنخفض ؛ و (ب) المعلومات المرئية لدعم هذه العملية من خلال توفير معلومات سياقية إضافية (مرئية) والتي قد تكون متاحة قبل إنتاج المدخلات النصية. لذلك ، نقترح نهجًا متعدد الوسائط للترجمة الآلية المتزامنة باستخدام التعلم المعزز ، مع استراتيجيات لدمج المعلومات المرئية والنصية في كل من الوكيل والبيئة. نحن نقدم استكشافًا حول كيفية تأثير الأنواع المختلفة من المعلومات المرئية واستراتيجيات التكامل على جودة نماذج الترجمة المتزامنة وزمن وصولها ، ونوضح أن الإشارات المرئية تؤدي إلى جودة أعلى مع الحفاظ على وقت الاستجابة منخفضًا.', 'pt': 'Este artigo aborda o problema da tradução automática simultânea (SiMT) explorando dois conceitos principais: (a) políticas adaptativas para aprender um bom compromisso entre alta qualidade de tradução e baixa latência; e (b) informações visuais para apoiar este processo, fornecendo informações contextuais (visuais) adicionais que podem estar disponíveis antes que a entrada textual seja produzida. Para isso, propomos uma abordagem multimodal de tradução automática simultânea usando aprendizado por reforço, com estratégias para integrar informações visuais e textuais tanto no agente quanto no ambiente. Fornecemos uma exploração sobre como diferentes tipos de informações visuais e estratégias de integração afetam a qualidade e a latência dos modelos de tradução simultânea e demonstramos que as dicas visuais levam a uma qualidade mais alta, mantendo a latência baixa.', 'es': 'Este documento aborda el problema de la traducción automática simultánea (SiMT) explorando dos conceptos principales: (a) políticas adaptativas para aprender una buena compensación entre alta calidad de traducción y baja latencia; y (b) información visual para apoyar este proceso al proporcionar información contextual (visual) adicional que puede estar disponible antes de que se produzca la entrada textual. Para ello, proponemos un enfoque multimodal para la traducción automática simultánea mediante el aprendizaje por refuerzo, con estrategias para integrar la información visual y textual tanto en el agente como en el entorno. Ofrecemos una exploración sobre cómo los diferentes tipos de información visual y las estrategias de integración afectan la calidad y la latencia de los modelos de traducción simultánea, y demostramos que las señales visuales conducen a una mayor calidad y mantienen baja la latencia.', 'fr': "Cet article aborde le problème de la traduction automatique simultanée (SimT) en explorant deux concepts principaux\xa0: (a) des politiques adaptatives pour apprendre un bon compromis entre une qualité de traduction élevée et une faible latence\xa0; et (b) des informations visuelles pour soutenir ce processus en fournissant des informations contextuelles (visuelles) supplémentaires qui peuvent être disponibles avant que l'entrée textuelle ne soit produite. Pour cela, nous proposons une approche multimodale de la traduction automatique simultanée utilisant l'apprentissage par renforcement, avec des stratégies pour intégrer des informations visuelles et textuelles à la fois dans l'agent et dans l'environnement. Nous proposons une exploration de la façon dont différents types d'informations visuelles et de stratégies d'intégration affectent la qualité et la latence des modèles de traduction simultanée, et démontrons que les indices visuels permettent d'améliorer la qualité tout en maintenant la latence faible.", 'ja': '本稿では、(a)高翻訳品質と低遅延の間の良好なトレードオフを学習する適応的なポリシー、および(b)テキスト入力が生成される前に利用可能な追加の（視覚的な）コンテキスト情報を提供することによって、このプロセスをサポートする視覚的な情報の2つの主な概念を探求することによって、同時機械翻訳（ SiMT ）の問題に取り組む。そのために、エージェントと環境の両方に視覚情報とテキスト情報を統合する戦略を用いた、強化学習を用いた同時機械翻訳へのマルチモーダルアプローチを提案します。さまざまなタイプの視覚情報と統合戦略が同時翻訳モデルの品質とレイテンシにどのように影響するかを探求し、レイテンシを低く保ちながら視覚的な手がかりがより高い品質につながることを実証します。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर दो मुख्य अवधारणाओं की खोज करके एक साथ मशीन अनुवाद (SiMT) की समस्या को संबोधित करता है: (ए) उच्च अनुवाद गुणवत्ता और कम विलंबता के बीच एक अच्छा व्यापार-बंद सीखने के लिए अनुकूली नीतियां; और (ख) अतिरिक्त (दृश्य) प्रासंगिक जानकारी प्रदान करके इस प्रक्रिया का समर्थन करने के लिए दृश्य जानकारी जो पाठ्य इनपुट का उत्पादन करने से पहले उपलब्ध हो सकती है। इसके लिए, हम सुदृढीकरण सीखने का उपयोग करके एक साथ मशीन अनुवाद के लिए एक बहुआयामी दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिसमें एजेंट और पर्यावरण दोनों में दृश्य और पाठ्य जानकारी को एकीकृत करने की रणनीतियां हैं। हम इस बात पर एक अन्वेषण प्रदान करते हैं कि विभिन्न प्रकार की दृश्य जानकारी और एकीकरण रणनीतियां एक साथ अनुवाद मॉडल की गुणवत्ता और विलंबता को कैसे प्रभावित करती हैं, और यह प्रदर्शित करती हैं कि दृश्य संकेत विलंबता को कम रखते हुए उच्च गुणवत्ता का कारण बनते हैं।', 'zh': '本文讨二大概以决之机器同声传译(SiMT):(a)自适之策,以学高译迟延之间; (b)视息,额外(视)上下文息以持之,其息在生文之前可用也。 同声传译法,摄境集视文。 论异类之息与集成同声传译其质与迟,明视提高质量,持下迟也。', 'ru': 'Этот документ решает проблему одновременного машинного перевода (SiMT) путем изучения двух основных концепций: (a) адаптивной политики для изучения хорошего компромисса между высоким качеством перевода и низкой задержкой; и (b) визуальной информации для поддержки этого процесса путем предоставления дополнительной (визуальной) контекстуальной информации, которая может быть доступна до подготовки текстового ввода. Для этого мы предлагаем мультимодальный подход к синхронному машинному переводу с использованием усиленного обучения, со стратегиями интеграции визуальной и текстовой информации как в агенте, так и в среде. Мы предлагаем исследование того, как различные типы визуальной информации и стратегии интеграции влияют на качество и задержку моделей одновременного перевода, и демонстрируем, что визуальные сигналы приводят к более высокому качеству, сохраняя при этом низкую задержку.', 'ga': "Tugann an páipéar seo aghaidh ar fhadhb an aistriúcháin chomhuainigh mheaisín (SiMT) trí dhá phríomhchoincheap a fhiosrú: (a) beartais oiriúnaitheacha chun comhbhabhtáil mhaith a fhoghlaim idir ardchaighdeán aistriúcháin agus foighne íseal; agus (b) faisnéis amhairc chun tacú leis an bpróiseas seo trí fhaisnéis chomhthéacsúil (amhairc) bhreise a sholáthar a d'fhéadfadh a bheith ar fáil sula gcuirtear an t-ionchur téacs ar fáil. Chuige sin, molaimid cur chuige ilmhódach maidir le haistriúchán comhuaineach meaisín ag baint úsáide as an bhfoghlaim threisithe, le straitéisí chun faisnéis amhairc agus téacs a chomhtháthú sa ghníomhaire agus sa chomhshaol araon. Cuirimid iniúchadh ar fáil ar an gcaoi a mbíonn tionchar ag cineálacha éagsúla faisnéise amhairc agus straitéisí comhtháthaithe ar cháilíocht agus ar fhoighne na múnlaí aistriúcháin chomhuainigh, agus léirímid go n-eascraíonn leideanna amhairc cáilíocht níos airde agus go gcoimeádtar an fhoighne íseal.", 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნტის პრობლემა, რომელიც ერთადერთი მანქანის გაგრძელების პრობლემა (SiMT) დააკვირდება ორი მნიშვნელოვანი კონცექტის გამოყენებით: a) ადაპტიგური პოლიტიკის გაგრძ და b) ვიზუალური ინფორმაცია, რომელიც ამ პროცესის მეტი (ვიზუალური) კონტექსტური ინფორმაცია, რომელიც შეიძლება იყოს ტექსტური შეტყობინება წინ შეიძლება ამისთვის, ჩვენ მულტიმოდიალური პროგორმაციას მუშაობით მაქინის გარგულისხმების გამოყენება სწავლებას, სტრატეგიებით ვიზუალური და ტექსტულური ინფორმაციის ინტერგურაციას ადვნენ ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ განსხვავებული ვიზუალური ინფორმაციის და ინტერგრაციის სტრატიგიების განსხვავებული ტიპების განსხვავებას, როგორ განსხვავებული ინფორმაციის და ინტერგრაციის სტრატიგიების შესახებ უფრო მეტი და', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány a szimultán gépi fordítás (SiMT) problémájával foglalkozik: a) adaptív politikák a magas fordítási minőség és az alacsony késleltetés közötti jó kompromisszum megteremtése érdekében; és b) vizuális információk, amelyek támogatják ezt a folyamatot olyan kiegészítő (vizuális) kontextuális információk biztosításával, amelyek a szöveges bevitel előállítása előtt elérhetőek lehetnek. Ehhez multimodális megközelítést javasolunk a szimultán gépi fordítás megerősítési tanulásával, stratégiákkal a vizuális és szöveges információk integrálására mind az ügynökben, mind a környezetben. Feltárjuk, hogy a különböző típusú vizuális információk és integrációs stratégiák hogyan befolyásolják a szimultán fordítási modellek minőségét és késleltetését, és bemutatjuk, hogy a vizuális utak jobb minőséget eredményeznek, miközben a késleltetés alacsony.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία αντιμετωπίζει το πρόβλημα της ταυτόχρονης μηχανικής μετάφρασης (SiMT) διερευνώντας δύο βασικές έννοιες: α) προσαρμοστικές πολιτικές για την εκμάθηση ενός καλού συμβιβασμού μεταξύ υψηλής ποιότητας μετάφρασης και χαμηλής καθυστέρησης· και β) οπτικές πληροφορίες για την υποστήριξη αυτής της διαδικασίας με την παροχή πρόσθετων (οπτικών) περιεκτικών πληροφοριών που ενδέχεται να είναι διαθέσιμες πριν από την παραγωγή των κειμένων. Για το σκοπό αυτό, προτείνουμε μια πολυμορφική προσέγγιση της ταυτόχρονης μηχανικής μετάφρασης χρησιμοποιώντας ενισχυτική μάθηση, με στρατηγικές ενσωμάτωσης οπτικών και κειμένων πληροφοριών τόσο στον παράγοντα όσο και στο περιβάλλον. Παρέχουμε μια διερεύνηση σχετικά με τον τρόπο με τον οποίο διαφορετικοί τύποι οπτικών πληροφοριών και στρατηγικών ολοκλήρωσης επηρεάζουν την ποιότητα και την καθυστέρηση των μοντέλων ταυτόχρονης μετάφρασης και καταδεικνύουμε ότι οι οπτικές ενδείξεις οδηγούν σε υψηλότερη ποιότητα, διατηρώντας παράλληλα την καθυστέρηση χαμηλή.', 'it': "Il presente documento affronta il problema della traduzione automatica simultanea (SiMT) esplorando due concetti principali: (a) politiche di adattamento per imparare un buon compromesso tra alta qualità della traduzione e bassa latenza; e (b) informazioni visive a supporto di questo processo fornendo informazioni contestuali aggiuntive (visive) che potrebbero essere disponibili prima della produzione dell'input testuale. Per questo, proponiamo un approccio multimodale alla traduzione automatica simultanea utilizzando l'apprendimento di rinforzo, con strategie per integrare informazioni visive e testuali sia nell'agente che nell'ambiente. Forniamo un'esplorazione su come diversi tipi di informazioni visive e strategie di integrazione influenzano la qualità e la latenza dei modelli di traduzione simultanea, e dimostriamo che i segnali visivi portano a una qualità superiore mantenendo la latenza bassa.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз екі негізгі концепцияларды зерттеп бірдей аудару (SiMT) компьютерінің мәселесін шешу: a) жоғары аудару сапасы мен төмен жақсы жақсы аудару сапасы арасындағы жақсы жұмыс саясатын үйрену үшін ад бұл процесті қолдауға арналған визуалдық мәліметтер мәтін енгізілмегеннен алдында қосымша (визуалдық) контексті мәлімет береді. Бұл үшін бір-бірінші машинаның аудармасына көмектесу үйренімізді қолдану арқылы көмектесу арқылы көмектесу арқылы көмектесу арқылы көмектесу арқылы көмектесеміз. Агент мен ор Біз көрінетін мәліметтер мен интеграциялық стратегияларының қанша түрлі түрлері бір-бір аудару үлгілерінің сапаты мен кеңістігін зерттеп, көрінетін мәліметтер кеңістіктерінің қанша сапасы жоғары са', 'lt': 'Šis dokumentas sprendžia vienu metu vertimo mašinomis problem ą (SiMT) išnagrinėjant dvi pagrindines sąvokas: a) pritaikymo politiką, skirtą gerai suderinti aukštos vertimo kokybės ir mažo latencijos vertimą; ir b) vizualinė informacija šiam procesui remti, teikiant papildomą (vizualinę) kontekstinę informaciją, kuri gali b ūti prieinama prieš pateikiant tekstinį įrašą. Todėl siūlome daugiarūšį požiūrį į vienu metu vertimą mašinomis naudojant stiprinamąjį mokymąsi ir strategijas, skirtas vizualiai ir tekstinei informacijai integruoti tiek į agent ą, tiek į aplinką. Pateikiame tyrimą, kaip įvairių rūšių vizualinės informacijos ir integracijos strategijos daro įtaką vienu metu naudojamų vertimo modelių kokybei ir vėlavimui, ir įrodome, kad vizualiniai ženklai užtikrina aukštesnę kokybę, o vėlavimas išlieka mažas.', 'mk': 'This paper addresses the problem of simultaneous machine translation (SiMT) by exploring two main concepts: (a) adaptive policies to learn a good trade-off between high translation quality and low latency;  и (b) визуелни информации за поддршка на овој процес со обезбедување дополнителни (визуелни) контекстни информации кои може да бидат достапни пред производството на текстуалниот внес. За тоа, предложуваме мултимодилен пристап кон симултантниот машински превод користејќи зајакнување на учењето, со стратегии за интеграција на визуелни и текстуални информации во агентот и во животната средина. Ние обезбедуваме истрага за тоа како различните типови на визуелни информации и стратегии за интеграција влијаат на квалитетот и ланценоста на истовремените преведувачки модели, и демонстрираме дека визуелните знаци водат до повисок квалитет, при што ланценоста', 'ms': 'This paper addresses the problem of simultaneous machine translation (SiMT) by exploring two main concepts: (a) adaptive policies to learn a good trade-off between high translation quality and low latency;  and (b) visual information to support this process by providing additional (visual) contextual information which may be available before the textual input is produced.  Untuk itu, kami cadangkan pendekatan multimodal untuk terjemahan mesin bersamaan menggunakan pembelajaran kuasa, dengan strategi untuk mengintegrasikan maklumat visual dan teks dalam agen dan persekitaran. Kami menyediakan eksplorasi bagaimana jenis berbeza maklumat visual dan strategi integrasi mempengaruhi kualiti dan keterlaluan model terjemahan bersamaan, dan menunjukkan bahawa isyarat visual membawa kepada kualiti yang lebih tinggi sambil menjaga keterlaluan rendah.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d രണ്ടു പ്രധാന ആശയങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഒരേ സമയം മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷയുടെ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു: (a) ഉയര്\u200dന്ന (b) ഈ പ്രക്രിയയെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കാനുള്ള കാഴ്ച വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d (കാഴ്ചയുള്ള) കൂടുതല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, ടെക്സ് അതിനു വേണ്ടി, ഒരേ സമയത്ത് മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു പല്ലിമോഡില്\u200d പ്രായോഗ്യം നാം പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നു. കൂടുതല്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക് വ്യത്യസ്ത തരം വിവരങ്ങളും ഒരുമിച്ചുകൂട്ടുന്ന യോജിപ്പുകളും ഒരേ സമയത്ത് പരിഭാഷകളുടെ ഗുണവും ലേറ്റിസ്റ്റേറ്റിയും ബാധിക്കുന്നു എന്ന് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പരിശ', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jindirizza l-problem a tat-traduzzjoni simultanja tal-magni (SiMT) billi jesplora żewġ kunċetti ewlenin: (a) politiki adattivi biex jitgħallem kompromess tajjeb bejn kwalità għolja tat-traduzzjoni u latenza baxxa; u (b) informazzjoni viżwali li tappoġġja dan il-proċess billi tipprovdi informazzjoni kontekstwali (viżwali) addizzjonali li tista’ tkun disponibbli qabel ma tiġi prodotta l-input testwali. Għal dan il-għan, nipproponu approċċ multimodali għat-traduzzjoni simultanja tal-magni bl-użu tat-tagħlim ta’ rinfurzar, bi strateġiji għall-integrazzjoni ta’ informazzjoni viżwali u testwali kemm fl-a ġent kif ukoll fl-ambjent. Aħna nipprovdu esplorazzjoni dwar kif tipi differenti ta’ informazzjoni viżiva u strateġiji ta’ integrazzjoni jaffettwaw il-kwalità u t-latenza tal-mudelli ta’ traduzzjoni simultanji, u nippruvaw li sinjali viżivi jwasslu għal kwalità ogħla filwaqt li jżommu t-latenza baxxa.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł porusza problem symultanicznego tłumaczenia maszynowego (SiMT) poprzez analizę dwóch głównych pojęć: (a) polityki adaptacyjnej w celu uzyskania dobrego kompromisu między wysoką jakością tłumaczenia a niskim opóźnieniem; oraz b) informacje wizualne wspierające ten proces poprzez dostarczenie dodatkowych (wizualnych) informacji kontekstowych, które mogą być dostępne przed wytworzeniem danych tekstowych. W tym celu proponujemy multimodalne podejście do symultanicznego tłumaczenia maszynowego z wykorzystaniem uczenia się wzmacniającego, wraz ze strategiami integracji informacji wizualnych i tekstowych zarówno w agentze, jak i w środowisku. Przedstawiamy analizę tego, jak różne rodzaje informacji wizualnych i strategii integracji wpływają na jakość i opóźnienie modeli tłumaczenia symultanicznego oraz pokazujemy, że sygnały wizualne prowadzą do wyższej jakości przy jednoczesnym utrzymaniu opóźnień na niskim poziomie.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare abordează problema traducerii automate simultane (SiMT) prin explorarea a două concepte principale: (a) politici adaptive pentru a învăța un compromis bun între calitatea ridicată a traducerii și latența scăzută; și (b) informații vizuale care să susțină acest proces prin furnizarea de informații contextuale (vizuale) suplimentare care pot fi disponibile înainte de producerea introducerii textului. Pentru aceasta, propunem o abordare multimodală a traducerii automate simultane folosind învățarea de armare, cu strategii de integrare a informațiilor vizuale și textuale atât în agent, cât și în mediu. Oferim o explorare a modului în care diferitele tipuri de informații vizuale și strategii de integrare afectează calitatea și latența modelelor de traducere simultană și demonstrăm că indiciile vizuale duc la o calitate superioară, menținând în același timp latența scăzută.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас хоёр чухал ойлголтыг судалгаад машин хөрөнгө оруулах асуудлыг харуулж байна: a) өндөр хөрөнгө оруулах чадвар болон бага сүүлийн хоорондын сайн худалдааны хоорондын сайн худалдааныг суралцах зорилготой засаг (b) энэ үйл явцыг дэмжихийн тулд харааны мэдээлэл нь textual input гаргахаас өмнө ашиглаж болох нэмэлт (visual) contextual information өгдөг. Үүний тулд бид машины хөгжлийн сургалтыг ашиглан олон загварын арга зам зөвшөөрөх боломжтой. Агент болон орчин тойронд харагдах, текст мэдээллийг нэгтгэх стратегийг ашиглаж байна. Бид өөр төрлийн үзэл мэдээлэл, интеграцийн стратегийг хэрхэн нөлөөлдөг вэ гэдгийг судалж өгдөг. Харин одоогийн орчуулах загварын сайн чанар болон хамааралтай загварын талаар харуулж, харагдах загварууд нь өндөр сайн чанар хүргэж', 'no': 'Denne papiret adresserer problemet på samtidig maskinsomsetjing (SiMT) ved å utforska to hovudkonseptar: a) tilpassande politikk for å læra ein god utvikling mellom høg omsetjingskvalitet og låg latens. og b) visuelle informasjon for å støtta denne prosessen ved å oppgje ekstra (visual) kontekstinformasjon som kan vera tilgjengeleg før tekstinndata vert produsert. Dette foreslår vi ein multimodal tilnærming til samtidig maskinsomsetjing ved å bruka styrke læring, med strategiar for å integrere visuelle og tekstinformasjon i både agent og miljøet. Vi gjev eit utforsk på korleis ulike typar visuelle informasjon og integreringsstrategier påvirkar kvaliteten og latens av samtidig omsetjingsmodular, og demonstrerer at visuale måtar fører til høgare kvalitet medan det gjer latensen lav.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan ayaa dhibaatada turjumista mashiinka (SiMT) ku baaraandegista laba fikrada oo muhiimka ah: (a) siyaasadaha adag u barashada ganacsiga wanaagsan oo u dhexeeya takhasuska turjumaadda sare iyo dhaqdhaqaalaha hoose; iyo macluumaad arag ah oo la kaalmeeyo baaritaankan, si ay u fidiso macluumaad dheeraad ah (aragti) oo ku socda, taasoo laga heli karo intaan laga soo saarin input qoraalka. Taas darteed waxaynu soo jeedinnaa qaabab kala duduwan oo aan turjumista mashiinka islamarkaasna ku isticmaalno horumarinta waxbarashada, waxayna leedahay strategiyo in la qabsasho macluumaadka aragga iyo qoraalka qoraalka labada midiidinka iyo deegaanka. Waxaan baaritaan sidoo kale qorshaha la-qabsashada ee macluumaadka aragga iyo la-qabsashada oo kala duduwan ay saameyn ugu yeelan karaan tusaalaha turjumidda islamarkaasna waxaan muujinaynaa in cudurada muuqashada la arko ay u leedahay qiimo sare, islamarkaasna ay hoos u leedahay ugu dambeysashada.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats behandlar problemet med simultan maskinöversättning (SiMT) genom att utforska två huvudbegrepp: a) anpassningspolitik för att lära sig en bra avvägning mellan hög översättningskvalitet och låg fördröjning. och b) visuell information som stöder denna process genom att tillhandahålla ytterligare (visuell) kontextuell information som kan finnas tillgänglig innan textinmatningen produceras. För detta föreslår vi ett multimodalt tillvägagångssätt för simultan maskinöversättning med hjälp av förstärkt lärande, med strategier för att integrera visuell och textinformation i både agent och miljö. Vi undersöker hur olika typer av visuell information och integrationsstrategier påverkar kvaliteten och latensen hos simultanöversättningsmodeller, och visar att visuella ledtrådar leder till högre kvalitet samtidigt som latensen hålls låg.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir rješava problem istovremenog prevoda mašine (SiMT) istražujući dve glavne koncepte: a) adaptivne politike za naučenje dobre trgovine između visoke kvalitete prevoda i niske latencije; i b) vizuelne informacije za podršku ovog procesa pružajući dodatne (vizuelne) kontekstne informacije koje mogu biti dostupne prije proizvodnje tekstualnog ulaza. Za to predlažemo multimodalni pristup istovremenom prevodu strojeva koristeći učenje pojačanja, sa strategijama za integraciju vizuelnih i tekstualnih informacija i agent a i okoliša. Mi pružamo istraživanje o tome kako različite vrste vizuelnih informacija i integracijskih strategija utječu na kvalitet i latenciju simultanih modela prevoda, i pokazujemo da vizualne znakove vode do višeg kvaliteta dok držimo nisku latenciju.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ එකම පද්ධති පද්ධතිය අවවාදය (SiMT) ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න: (a) සැකස සහ (b) ප්\u200dරදේශ තොරතුරු මෙම ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාව සහාය කරන්න පුළුවන් (ප්\u200dරදේශ) සම්බන්ධ තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ කරන්න පුළු ඒකෙන්, අපි ගොඩක් මාධ්\u200dයමාන්\u200dය පරිවර්තනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ පරිවර්තනය සමඟ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සමඟ ප අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙන්නේ වෙනස් වර්ගයක් දිහා තොරතුරු සහ සම්බන්ධ ව්\u200dයාපෘතිය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සමාන්\u200dය වාර්තාවක් ගැන සමාන්\u200dය වාර්තාවේ ක', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதம் இரண்டு முக்கிய கருத்துக்களை கண்டுபிடித்து ஒரே இயந்திர மொழிபெயர்ப்பின் பிரச்சனையைக் குறிக்கிறது: (a) உயர்ந்த மொழிபெயர்ப் (b) உரை உள்ளீடு உருவாக்குவதற்கு முன்னால் கூடுதல் (பார்வையான) தற்போதைய தகவலை வழங்குவதற்காக இந்த செயலை ஆதரிக்கும் பார்வை தக அதுக்காக, நாம் ஒரு பல்முறையான வழிமாற்றத்தை ஒரே இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பிற்கு முன்நிர்ணயிக்க முடியும், அதிகரிப்பு கற்றத்தை பயன்படுத்தி, பார் நாம் எவ்வாறு வேறு வகையான பார்வை தகவல் மற்றும் ஒருங்கிணைப்பு முறைமைகளை எப்படி பார்வையும் சேர்க்கும் திட்டங்கள் ஒரே நேரத்தில் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு ம', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ایک دوسرے مشین ترجمہ کے مسئلہ کے بارے میں مشکل کا تحقیق کرتا ہے، دو اصلی نظریں کا تحقیق کرتا ہے: (a) اچھی ترجمہ کیفیت اور کم لٹنسی کے درمیان اچھی ترجمہ کی تجارت کا اچھا طریقہ سکھنا چاہتا ہے۔ اور (b) اس پرسس کی مدد کرنے کے لئے ویزیئل معلومات کی جگہ سے اضافہ (visual) contextual معلومات عطا کرتی ہے جو textual input پیدا ہونے سے پہلے موجود ہو سکتی ہے۔ اس کے لئے ہم ایک مطابق مطابق مطابق کی تعلیم کے مطابق ایک متعدد موڈال طریقہ کی پیشنهاد کریں گے، مطابق مطابق کی استراتژی کے مطابق، نظریہ اور تفصیل معلومات کے ساتھ مطابق مطابق اور محیط اطلاعات میں ہم ایک تحقیق دیتے ہیں کہ کس طرح مختلف بصیرت کی تصویر معلومات اور تفریق استراتژیکوں نے ایک دوسرے ترجمہ موڈل کی کیفیت اور لٹینٹی پر اثر دیتے ہیں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ visual cues کو اچھی کیفیت تک پہنچاتے ہیں اور لٹینٹی کو کم رکھتے ہیں', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz ikkita asosiy g'oyalarni aniqlash orqali bir xil mashina tarjima qilish muammolarini anglatadi:(a) yuqori tarjima sifatida yaxshi taʼminlovchi qoidalarni o'rganish uchun yaxshi darajada o'rganadi; va bu jarayonni qoʻllash uchun qoʻshimcha ma'lumot yordam beradi. Matn kiritishdan oldin qoʻshimcha ma'lumot yordam beradi. Bu uchun, biz bir xil mashina tarjima qilishni o'rganishni foydalanish uchun multimodal tilni tahrirlash imkoniyatlarini o'rganish uchun o'zgarishni qo'yish va texnologiya maʼlumotini birlashtirish strategiya bilan o'ylaymiz. Biz ko'rinish turlari va bir xil tarjima modellarining sifatida va lateksiyatlarini qo'llab beradi va ko'rinish xususiyatlarini ko'rsatish mumkin, eng oxirgi narsalarni kamaytirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này đề cập đến vấn đề dịch thuật đồng thời (Sipal) bằng cách khám phá hai khái niệm chính: a) các chính sách thích nghi để học cách trao đổi tốt giữa chất lượng dịch cao và hạn chót; và b) thông tin thị giác để hỗ trợ tiến trình này b ằng cách cung cấp các thông tin định ngữ (trực tiếp) bổ sung có thể cung cấp trước khi kết cấu kết xuất. Vì vậy, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp đa phương pháp dịch phụ đồng thời bằng thiết bị học cải thiện, với các chiến lược để hoà nhập thông tin hình ảnh và kết cấu trong cả môi trường. Chúng tôi cung cấp một cuộc nghiên cứu về các loại thông tin trực tiếp khác nhau và các chiến lược hòa nhập ảnh hưởng đến chất lượng và tiềm năng của các mô hình dịch đồng thời, và chứng minh các tín hiệu hình ảnh dẫn đến chất lượng cao hơn, trong khi hạn chế tiềm tàng.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия разглежда проблема със симултанен машинен превод (SIMT), като изследва две основни понятия: (а) адаптивни политики за постигане на добър компромис между високо качество на превода и ниска латентност; и б) визуална информация в подкрепа на този процес чрез предоставяне на допълнителна (визуална) контекстуална информация, която може да е налична преди създаването на текстовия вход. За целта предлагаме мултимодален подход към симултанен машинен превод чрез усвояване на обучението, със стратегии за интегриране на визуална и текстова информация както в агента, така и в средата. Предлагаме проучване как различните видове визуална информация и стратегии за интеграция влияят върху качеството и латентността на моделите на симултанен превод и демонстрираме, че визуалните сигнали водят до по-високо качество, като същевременно запазват латентността ниска.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel behandelt het probleem van simultane machinevertaling (SiMT) door twee hoofdconcepten te onderzoeken: (a) adaptief beleid om een goede afweging te leren tussen hoge vertaalkwaliteit en lage latentie; en b) visuele informatie ter ondersteuning van dit proces door aanvullende (visuele) contextuele informatie te verstrekken die beschikbaar kan zijn voordat de tekstuele invoer wordt geproduceerd. Hiervoor stellen we een multimodale benadering voor van simultane machinevertaling met behulp van versterking learning, met strategieën om visuele en tekstuele informatie te integreren in zowel de agent als de omgeving. We onderzoeken hoe verschillende soorten visuele informatie en integratiestrategieën de kwaliteit en latentie van simultane vertaalmodellen beïnvloeden en tonen aan dat visuele signalen leiden tot hogere kwaliteit terwijl de latentie laag blijft.', 'da': 'Dette dokument behandler problemet med simultan maskinoversættelse (SiMT) ved at undersøge to hovedbegreber: a) adaptive politikker for at lære en god afvejning mellem høj oversættelseskvalitet og lav ventetid og b) visuelle oplysninger til støtte for denne proces ved at tilvejebringe yderligere (visuelle) kontekstuelle oplysninger, som kan være tilgængelige, før tekstens input produceres. Derfor foreslår vi en multimodal tilgang til simultan maskinoversættelse ved hjælp af forstærkningslæring, med strategier til at integrere visuel og tekstinformation i både agent og miljø. Vi giver en undersøgelse af, hvordan forskellige typer visuel information og integrationsstrategier påvirker kvaliteten og latensen af simultanoversættelsesmodeller, og demonstrerer, at visuelle signaler fører til højere kvalitet, samtidig med at latensen holdes lav.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir rješava problem istovremenog prevoda stroja (SiMT) istražujući dvije glavne koncepte: a) adaptivne politike za naučenje dobre trgovine između visoke kvalitete prevoda i niske latencije; i b) vizualne informacije za podršku ovog procesa pružajući dodatne (vizualne) contextualne informacije koje mogu biti dostupne prije proizvodnje tekstualnog ulaza. Za to predlažemo multimodalni pristup istovremenom prevodu strojeva koristeći učenje pojačanja, s strategijama integracije vizuelnih i tekstualnih informacija i agent a i okoliša. Mi pružamo istraživanje o tome kako različite vrste vizuelnih informacija i integracijskih strategija utječu na kvalitetu i latenciju simultannih modela prevoda, i pokazujemo da vizualne znakove vode do višeg kvaliteta dok zadržavaju nisku latenciju.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mengatasi masalah terjemahan mesin simultan (SiMT) dengan mengeksplorasi dua konsep utama: (a) kebijakan adaptif untuk belajar perdagangan yang baik antara kualitas terjemahan tinggi dan latensi rendah; dan (b) informasi visual untuk mendukung proses ini dengan menyediakan informasi kontekstual (visual) tambahan yang mungkin tersedia sebelum input tekstual diproduksi. Untuk itu, kami mengusulkan pendekatan multimodal untuk terjemahan mesin simultan menggunakan pelajaran penuh, dengan strategi untuk mengintegrasi informasi visual dan tekstual di agen dan lingkungan. Kami menyediakan eksplorasi tentang bagaimana tipe berbeda informasi visual dan strategi integrasi mempengaruhi kualitas dan keterlaluan model terjemahan simultan, dan menunjukkan bahwa tanda-tanda visual mengarah ke kualitas yang lebih tinggi sambil menjaga keterlaluan rendah.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit befasst sich mit dem Problem der simultanen maschinellen Übersetzung (SiMT), indem zwei Hauptkonzepte untersucht werden: (a) adaptive Strategien, um einen guten Kompromiss zwischen hoher Übersetzungsqualität und niedriger Latenz zu lernen; und b) visuelle Informationen zur Unterstützung dieses Prozesses, indem zusätzliche (visuelle) Kontextinformationen bereitgestellt werden, die vor der Erstellung der Texteingabe verfügbar sein können. Dazu schlagen wir einen multimodalen Ansatz der simultanen maschinellen Übersetzung mit Verstärkungslernen vor, mit Strategien zur Integration visueller und textueller Informationen sowohl im Agenten als auch in der Umgebung. Wir untersuchen, wie verschiedene Arten von visuellen Informationen und Integrationsstrategien die Qualität und Latenz von Simultanübersetzungsmodellen beeinflussen und zeigen, dass visuelle Hinweise zu einer höheren Qualität führen und gleichzeitig die Latenz niedrig halten.', 'ko': '본고는 두 가지 주요 개념을 연구함으로써 동시통역(SimT) 문제를 해결한다. (a) 자체 적응 전략으로 높은 번역의 질과 낮은 지연 사이에서 좋은 균형을 이룬다.(b) 시각 정보는 추가 (시각) 상하문 정보를 제공함으로써 이 과정을 지원한다. 이런 정보는 텍스트 입력이 발생하기 전에 사용할 수 있다.이를 위해 우리는 학습을 강화하는 다중모드 동시통역 방법을 사용했고 이 방법은 에이전트와 환경에서 시각과 텍스트 정보를 통합시키는 전략을 채택했다.우리는 서로 다른 유형의 시각 정보와 통합 전략이 동시통역 모델의 질과 지연에 어떻게 영향을 미치는지 연구했고 시각 단서가 낮은 지연을 유지하는 동시에 번역의 질을 향상시킬 수 있음을 증명했다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linazungumzia tatizo la kutafsiri mashine wakati mmoja (SiMT) kwa kutafuta dhana mbili kubwa: (a) sera zinazochanganya ili kujifunza biashara nzuri kati ya ubora wa tafsiri na kiwango cha chini cha ugumu; na taarifa za kuona za kuunga mkono mchakato huu kwa kutoa taarifa za muda mrefu za (kuona) ambazo zinaweza kupatikana kabla ya kuandaa ujumbe wa maandishi. Kwa hilo, tunapendekeza mbinu za utafsiri wa mashine kwa wakati mmoja kwa kutumia kujifunza kwa nguvu, na mikakati ya kuunganisha taarifa za kuona na uhalisia katika shirika hilo na mazingira. Tunatoa uchunguzi wa namna aina tofauti ya taarifa na mipango ya pamoja yanavyoathiri ubora na wa hivi karibuni ya mifano ya tafsiri kwa wakati mmoja, na kuonyesha kuwa viungo vya kuona vinapelekea kiwango kikubwa wakati wa kudhibiti hali ya hivi karibuni.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ مشکل ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین همزمان (SiMT) را با تحقیق دو فرضیه اصلی درباره\u200cی بررسی می\u200cکند: a) سیاست\u200cهای adaptive برای یاد گرفتن تجارت خوبی بین کیفیت ترجمه\u200cهای بالا و پایین\u200cترجمه\u200cی پایین\u200cترجمه\u200cای یاد می\u200c و (b) اطلاعات دیده برای پشتیبانی این فرایند با ارائه دادن اطلاعات موضوع بیشتری (دیده) که ممکن است قبل از اینکه وارد متن تولید شود موجود باشد. برای این، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش چندین مدل برای ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین همزمان با استراتژی\u200cها برای تأکید کردن اطلاعات دیده و متن در ماشین و محیط. ما یک تحقیقات را در مورد اینکه چگونه نوع اطلاعات دیده و استراتژی\u200cهای جمع\u200cآوری\u200cها به کیفیت و کنترل مدل\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cهای همزمان تأثیر می\u200cدهند، و نشان می\u200cدهیم که نشان\u200cدهندگان دیده\u200cها به کیفیت بالاتر می\u200cرسند در حالی که کنتر', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz ýekeje maşynyň terjimesiniň (SiMT) iki esasy düşünjäni keşfederek meseleni çözýär: a) ýokary terjime kwaliteti we a şak terjime etmek üçin gowy terjime etmek üçin gowy terjime etmek üçin golaý düzümlerni çözýär. we (b) metin girişinden öň elýeterli (görsel) senedi maglumatlary getirmek üçin bu proses ünsüni desteklemek üçin görsel maglumatlar Şonuň üçin biz maşynyň terjimesini köpürlemek öwrenmesini ulanan, görsel we tekst maglumatyny hem ajaýyr we çevrede birleştirmek üçin stratejiýalary gollaşdyrýarys. Biz görsel maglumatlaryň we integrasyň stratejikleriniň nähili görnüş nusgalarynyň keyfiýeti we geçişik nusgalarynyň täsirini tassyklap edýändigini we görsel ukamlaryň ýokary kalitede ýokaryny görkezip berýäris.', 'af': "Hierdie papier adreseer die probleem van samekomstige masjien vertaling (SiMT) deur twee hoofde konsepte te ondersoek: (a) aanpasbare beleid om 'n goeie handel af te leer tussen hoë vertaling kwaliteit en lae latensie; en en (b) visuele inligting om hierdie proses te ondersteun deur addisionele (visuele) contextual inligting te verskaf wat dalk beskikbaar kan wees voor die tekstuele invoer te produseer. Daarom stel ons 'n multimodaal toegang voor te stel tot simultanee masjien vertaling deur te gebruik versterking leer, met strategies om visuele en tekstuele inligting in beide die agent en die omgewing te integreer. Ons verskaf 'n uitsoek oor hoe verskillende tipes van visuele inligting en integrasie strategies influens die kwaliteit en latensie van simultanee vertalingsmodelle, en wys dat visuale tekens lei na hoër kwaliteit terwyl die latensie laag hou.", 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም ሁለትን ዋና አዋጅ አሳብ በመፍጠር በመጠቀም የመሳሳይ ትርጉም ጉዳይ (SiMT):(a) ከፍተኛ ትርጓሜ ጥሩ እና ታናሽ ቅድሚያ መካከል መልካም ንግድ-ጥቅም ለመማር በሚያስተምሩ ፖሊሲዎች ያስተካክላል፡ (b) ይህንን ፕሮግራም ለመደጋገም የራእይ መረጃ በመጠቀም የጽሑፍ ጥያቄ ውስጥ ከመፍጠር በፊት ይችላል፡፡ ለዚህ ምክንያት፣ የዓይነ እና የጽሑፍ መረጃዎችን በአካባቢ እና አካባቢ እና አካባቢ እና አካባቢ ውስጥ ለመጠቀም በተጨማሪው የሞክራዊ ትርጓሜዎችን ለመጠቀም እና ለመጠቀም የምናስፈልጋለን፡፡ በተለያዩ ዓይነቶች የዓይነ መረጃ እና የኢንተርኔት ዘዴዎች በተጨማሪው የጥያቄ እና ቅድሚያ የሚደርስባቸው እና የዓይነቶች ክፍሎች የቅርብ ጥሩ እንዲያሳዩ እናሳያልን፡፡', 'sq': 'Ky dokument trajton problemin e përkthimit të njëkohëshëm të makinave (SiMT) duke eksploruar dy koncepte kryesore: (a) politika adaptuese për të mësuar një kompromis të mirë midis cilësisë së lartë të përkthimit dhe vonesës së ulët; dhe (b) informacion vizual për të mbështetur këtë proces duke ofruar informacion shtesë (vizual) kontekstual që mund të jetë në dispozicion përpara se të prodhohet input tekstual. Për këtë, ne propozojmë një qasje multimodale për përkthimin e njëkohëshëm të makinave duke përdorur mësimin e forcimit, me strategji për të integruar informacionin vizual dhe tekstual si në agjent ashtu edhe në mjedis. Ne ofrojmë një eksplorim se si llojet e ndryshme të informacionit vizual dhe strategjive të integrimit ndikojnë në cilësinë dhe vonesën e modeleve të përkthimit të njëkohëshëm dhe demonstrojmë se shenjat vizuale çojnë në cilësi më të lartë ndërsa mbajnë vonesën të ulët.', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը լուծում է միաժամանակական մեքենայի թարգմանման (SiMT) խնդիրը՝ ուսումնասիրելով երկու հիմնական գաղափար. a) ադապտիվ քաղաքականությունը բարձր թարգմանման որակի և ցածր ուշացության միջև լավ հակամարտություն սովորելու համար: և b) տեսողական ինֆորմացիա, որպեսզի աջակցենք այս գործընթացը, ապահովելով ավելին (տեսողական) կոնտեքստալ ինֆորմացիա, որը կարող է հասանելի լինել տեքստալ ինֆորմացիայի առաջ: Այդ պատճառով մենք առաջարկում ենք բազմամոդալ մոտեցում միաժամանակ մեքենայի թարգմանմանը, օգտագործելով ուժեղացված ուսումնասիրությունը, որն ունի վիզուալ և տեքստալ տեղեկատվություն ինտեգրելու ռազմավարության մեջ, ինչպես նաև միջավայ Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե ինչպես տեսողական տեղեկատվության տարբեր տեսակները և ինտեգրացիայի ռազմավարությունները ազդում են միևնույն ժամանակ թարգմանվող մոդելների որակի և ուշացության վրա, և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ տեսողական նշանները հանգեցնում են բարձր որակի, մինչ', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা একই সাথে মেশিন অনুবাদ (সিএমটি) এর সমস্যার কথা বলেছে: দুটি প্রধান ধারণা অনুসন্ধানের মাধ্যমে: (a) উচ্চ অনুবাদের মান এবং কম সম্পাদনের মধ্যে ভা এবং (b) এই প্রক্রিয়াকে সমর্থন করার জন্য দৃশ্যমান তথ্য প্রদান করা যায় যা টেক্সচুয়াল ইনপুট তৈরি হওয়ার আগে পাওয়া যাবে। For that, we propose a multimodal approach to simultaneous machine translation using reinforcement learning, with strategies to integrate visual and textual information in both the agent and the environment.  আমরা একটি গবেষণা দেখাচ্ছি কিভাবে ভিন্ন ধরনের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি তথ্য এবং একত্রিত কৌশলগুলো একই সাথে অনুবাদ মডেলের মান এবং সামান্য কৌশলের উপর প্রভাব ফেলে দ', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir rješava problem istovremenog prevoda mašine (SiMT) istraživanjem dva glavnog koncepta: a) adaptivne politike za naučenje dobre trgovine između visoke kvalitete prevoda i niske latencije; i b) vizualne informacije za podršku ovog procesa pružajući dodatne (vizualne) contextualne informacije koje mogu biti dostupne prije proizvodnje tekstualnog ulaza. Za to predlažemo multimodalni pristup istovremenom prevodu strojeva koristeći učenje pojačanja, sa strategijama za integraciju vizuelnih i tekstualnih informacija i agent a i okoliša. Mi pružamo istraživanje o tome kako različite vrste vizuelnih informacija i integracijskih strategija utječu na kvalitetu i latenciju simultanih modela prevoda, i pokazujemo da vizualni znakovi vode do višeg kvaliteta dok držimo nisku latenciju.', 'ca': "Aquest paper aborda el problem a de la traducció automàtica simultànea (SiMT) explorant dos conceptes principals: a) polítices adaptatives per aprendre un bon compromís entre alta qualitat de traducció i baixa latencia; i b) informació visual per sostenir aquest procés proporcionant informació contextual adicional (visual) que pot estar disponible abans de produir la entrada textual. Per això, proposem un enfocament multimodal a la traducció automàtica simultànea fent servir l'aprenentatge de reforç, amb estratègies per integrar la informació visual i textual tant en l'agent com en l'entorn. Ofereixem una exploració sobre com diferents tipus d'informació visual i estratègies d'integració afecten la qualitat i la latencia dels models simultàneos de traducció, i demostrem que les indicacions visuals porten a una qualitat més alta, mantenint la latencia baixa.", 'az': 'Bu kağıt iki ana fikirləri keşfetmək üçün istifadə edir: a) yüksək tercümə keyfiyyəti və düşük latensiya arasındakı yaxşı ticarət öyrənmək üçün uyğun siyasətləri ilə birlikdə maşın tercüməsinin problemini çəkir. və b) bu prosesini dəstəkləmək üçün görsel məlumatlar məlumatlar yaratmadan əvvəl əlavə edilə bilər. Buna görə də biz bir-birinin maşın çevirisinin çoxlu modal tərzini təklif edirik ki, möhkəm öyrənməsini istifadə edərək, görsel və tekst məlumatlarını hem ajanda hem çevredə birləşdirmək üçün stratejilərlə birləşdiririk. Biz bir keşif yaratma modellerinin keyfiyyətinə və sıxıntısına bənzər görünür məlumatlarının və integrasiya stratejilərinin necə təsirlərini təşkil edir və görünür məlumatlarının daha yüksək keyfiyyətinə sürüklədiyini göstəririk.', 'cs': 'Tento článek se zabývá problémem simultánního strojového překladu (SiMT) zkoumáním dvou hlavních konceptů: (a) adaptivní politiky pro naučení se dobrého kompromisu mezi vysokou kvalitou překladu a nízkou latencí; a b) vizuální informace na podporu tohoto procesu poskytnutím dodatečných (vizuálních) kontextových informací, které mohou být k dispozici před vytvořením textového vstupu. Za tímto účelem navrhujeme multimodální přístup k simultánnímu strojovému překladu s využitím zesilovacího učení, se strategií pro integraci vizuálních a textových informací jak do agenta, tak do prostředí. Poskytujeme průzkum toho, jak různé typy vizuálních informací a integračních strategií ovlivňují kvalitu a latenci simultánních překladových modelů, a demonstrujeme, že vizuální návody vedou k vyšší kvalitě při zachování nízké latence.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis käsitletakse sünkroontõlke probleemi, uurides kahte peamist kontseptsiooni: a) kohanduvad poliitikad, et õppida hea kompromisse kõrge tõlkekvaliteedi ja madala latentsuse vahel; ja b) visuaalne teave selle protsessi toetamiseks, pakkudes täiendavat (visuaalset) kontekstiteavet, mis võib olla kättesaadav enne tekstisisendi koostamist. Selleks pakume välja multimodaalse lähenemisviisi sünkroontõlkele, kasutades tugevdusõpet, koos strateegiatega visuaalse ja tekstilise teabe integreerimiseks nii agendis kui ka keskkonnas. Me uurime, kuidas erinevad visuaalse teabe tüübid ja integratsioonistrateegiad mõjutavad sünkroontõlke mudelite kvaliteeti ja latentsust ning näitame, et visuaalsed vihjed viivad kõrgema kvaliteedini, hoides samal ajal latentsuse madalal.', 'fi': 'Tässä asiakirjassa käsitellään simultaanisen konekäännöksen ongelmaa tarkastelemalla kahta pääkäsitettä: a) mukautuvat politiikat, joilla voidaan oppia hyvä kompromisse korkean käännöslaadun ja alhaisen viiveen välillä; ja b) visuaalista tietoa tämän prosessin tueksi antamalla (visuaalista) asiayhteyteen liittyvää lisätietoa, joka saattaa olla saatavilla ennen tekstisyötteen tuottamista. Tätä varten ehdotamme multimodaalista lähestymistapaa simultaaniseen konekäännökseen käyttäen vahvistusoppimista, jossa on strategioita integroida visuaalinen ja tekstillinen tieto sekä agenttiin että ympäristöön. Tutkimme, miten erilaiset visuaaliset tiedot ja integraatiostrategiat vaikuttavat simultaanikäännösmallien laatuun ja viiveeseen, ja osoitamme, että visuaaliset vihjeet johtavat parempaan laatuun ja pitävät viiveen matalana.', 'jv': 'Awak iki diperawat karo perkoro sing dibutuhke tarjamahan sampeyan (SiMT) iki dadi pangunahing sampeyan: a) politik adatapi kanggo mulai perkoro sing apik terus nesaturan kalagayut terjamahan sak mbaar sêt. y Saiki, kéné supoyo sistem multimodal kanggo tarjamahan sampeyan gambar nggawe ngubah Jejaring nggawe lan staji sing beraksi lan nggawe informasi ngerasakno ning anyar lan ingkang ambabaran sampeyan. Awak dhéwé éntuk karo pernik-pernik karo sistem sing gak bener nggawe informasi sistem sing gak penting nggawe ngubah kuwi kesempatan karo sistem sing itlanjut sampeyan karo sistem sing tarjamahan, lan ngéwong-wong kuwi pernik kuwi kapan anyar sampeyan sing bakal terus nggawe kapan-kapan', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek obravnava problem simultanega strojnega prevajanja z raziskovanjem dveh glavnih konceptov: (a) prilagodljivih politik za ugotovitev dobrega kompromisa med visoko kakovostjo prevajanja in nizko latenco; in (b) vizualne informacije, ki podpirajo ta proces z zagotavljanjem dodatnih (vizualnih) kontekstualnih informacij, ki so lahko na voljo pred pripravo besedilnega vnosa. V ta namen predlagamo multimodalni pristop k simultanemu strojnemu prevajanju s pomočjo ojačitvenega učenja s strategijami integracije vizualnih in besedilnih informacij v agent in okolje. Raziskovali bomo, kako različne vrste vizualnih informacij in integracijskih strategij vplivajo na kakovost in latenco modelov simultanega prevajanja, ter dokazali, da vizualni namigi vodijo k višji kakovosti, hkrati pa ohranjajo nizko latenco.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis da kunnuwa na gane da za'a ƙarfafa wannan aikin da za'a samar da wasu information masu ƙaranci (ga gannai) wanda za'a iya iya samar da shi a gaba ga injistan rubutun. Daga wannan, Muke bukãtar wa masu multiodal zuwa fassarar mashine da ake samu da amfani da ƙaranci, suna da kimar ƙaranci, kuma masu istigizo da za'a haɗa masu gani da matsayi cikin mazaɓa da mazaɓa. Munã bãyar da rabo a kan jine irin mutane na gannai da takwarar integratewa sun yi amfani da tsari da latent na misãlai masu fassarar da sami-sami, kuma Muke nuna cewa cutun masu gani sun ƙara da sifa a lokacin da za'a ƙara ƙaranci.", 'bo': 'This paper addresses the problem of simultaneous machine translation (SiMT) by exploring two main concepts: (a) adaptive policies to learn a good trade-off between high translation quality and low latency; and and (b) visual information to support this process by providing additional (visual) contextual information which may be available before the textual input is produced. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ལག་ལེན་པའི་སྣ་ཚོགས་གྱི་བཟོ་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་ལ་སྤྱད་ནས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཐབས་བྱས་པ་དང་། བྱ་སྤྱོད་དང་རང་ ང་ཚོས་མཐོང་བའི་དབྱེ་བ་དང་དབྱིབས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་གྲ་སྒྲིག་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་མ་འདྲ་བ་དེ་གིས་གནས་སྟངས་དང་latency of simultaneous translation models་དང་མཐོང་ནུས་ཡོད་དེ་ལ་མཐོང་བའ', 'he': 'העבודה הזו מתייחסת לבעיה של התרגום המכונית באופן יחידי (SiMT) על ידי חקירה של שתי מושג ראשיים: (a) מדיניות מתאימות ללמוד סחר טוב בין איכות התרגום גבוהה לאטנציה נמוכה; (b) מידע ויזואלי לתמוך בתהליך הזה על ידי הספק מידע (ויזואלי) קונטוקטואלי נוסף שאולי יהיה זמין לפני שהכניסה הטקסטלית יוצרת. בשביל זה, אנו מציעים גישה מולטומודלית לתרגום מכונות באותו זמן באמצעות לימוד חיבורי, עם אסטרטגיות לשתלב מידע ויזואלי וגם טקסטאלי בשני הסוכן וגם בסביבה. אנו מספקים חקירה על איך סוגים שונים של מידע ויזואלי ואסטרטגיות אינטגרציה משפיעים על איכות ולאוטנציה של דוגמני התרגום באופן זמני, ולהראות כי סימני ויזואלים מובילים לאיכות גבוהה בזמן שהאוטנציה נמוכה.'}
{'en': 'Do Multi-Hop Question Answering Systems Know How to Answer the Single-Hop Sub-Questions?', 'pt': 'Os sistemas de resposta a perguntas multi-hop sabem como responder às sub-perguntas de salto único?', 'ar': 'هل تعرف أنظمة الإجابة على الأسئلة ذات القفزات المتعددة كيفية الإجابة على الأسئلة الفرعية ذات القفزة الواحدة؟', 'es': '¿Saben los sistemas de respuesta a preguntas de salto múltiple cómo responder a las subpreguntas de salto único?', 'fr': 'Les systèmes de réponse aux questions à sauts multiples savent-ils comment répondre aux sous-questions à saut unique\xa0?', 'ja': 'マルチホップクエスチョンアンサーシステムは、シングルホップサブクエスチョンに答える方法を知っていますか？', 'zh': '多跳问系统知所以对单跳子乎?', 'ru': 'Знают ли системы многохоповых ответов на вопросы, как ответить на однохоповые подвопросы?', 'hi': 'क्या मल्टी-हॉप प्रश्न उत्तर देने वाली प्रणालियों को पता है कि एकल-हॉप उप-प्रश्नों का उत्तर कैसे दिया जाए?', 'ga': 'An bhfuil a fhios ag Córais Freagartha Ceisteanna Il-Hop Conas na Fo-Cheisteanna Aon-Hop a Fhreagairt?', 'ka': 'გყოპჲჟა ჲრდჲგჲპწღთ ჟთჟრვმთრვ ჱნაწრ ლთ კაკ ეა ჲრდჲგჲპწრ ნა ვეთნჟრგვნთრვ ოჲეკყოთ?', 'hu': 'Tudják-e a multi-hop kérdésre válaszoló rendszerek, hogyan kell válaszolni az egy-hop alkérdésekre?', 'el': 'Γνωρίζουν τα συστήματα απάντησης ερωτήσεων πώς να απαντήσουν στις υπο-ερωτήσεις;', 'it': 'I sistemi di risposta alle domande multi-hop sanno come rispondere alle sotto-domande single-hop?', 'kk': 'Көп-хоп сұрақ жауап беру жүйелері бір-хоп суролға жауап беруді біледі ме?', 'lt': 'Ar daugiapakopės atsakymo į klausimus sistemos žino, kaip atsakyti į vienkartinius paklausimus?', 'mk': 'Дали системите за одговори на неколку прашања знаат како да одговараат на неколку подпрашања?', 'ml': 'പല- ഹോപ്പ് ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്ന ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് എങ്ങനെയെന്ന് അറിയാമോ?', 'ms': 'Adakah Sistem Penjawapan soalan Multi-Hop tahu bagaimana menjawab Sub-soalan Single-Hop?', 'mt': 'Is-Sistemi ta’ Tweġiba għal Mistoqsijiet Multi-Hop jafu kif għandhom iwieġbu għas-Sottomistoqsijiet Single-Hop?', 'mn': 'Олон-Hop асуулт хариулах системүүд нэг-Hop доор асуултыг хэрхэн хариулах вэ?', 'pl': 'Czy systemy odpowiedzi na pytania Multi-Hop wiedzą, jak odpowiedzieć na podpytania Single-Hop?', 'no': 'Vil fleirhopp spørsmålsystemet svara på svar på svar på underspørsmålene?', 'ro': 'Sistemele de răspuns la întrebări multi-hop știu cum să răspundă la sub-întrebările single-hop?', 'si': 'ගොඩක් හෝප් ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දන්නවද Single-Hop Sub-ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කොහොම', 'so': "Isticmaalka ka jawaabaya su'aalo badan oo aad u taqaan sida loo jawaabo su'aalaha kooban-Hop?", 'sv': 'Vet Multi-Hop frågesvarssystem hur man svarar på Single-Hop-underfrågorna?', 'sr': 'Da li sistemi odgovaraju na pitanje multihopa znaju kako odgovoriti na podpitanja?', 'ta': 'Multi- Hop கேள்வி தொகுதிகளுக்கு பதில் எப்படி ஒற்றை ஹாப் துணை கேள்விகளுக்கு பதில் அளிக்க வேண்டும் என்று தெரியுமா?', 'ur': 'کیا Multi-Hop سوال جواب دینے کی سیسٹم جانتے ہیں کہ ایک Hop Sub-Questions کیسے جواب دیں؟', 'uz': 'Bir necha harf soʻrovi tizimga javob berishni istaysizmi?', 'vi': 'Hệ thống trả lời câu hỏi đa leo có biết cách trả lời câu hỏi đơn leo không?', 'hr': 'Znaju li sustavi odgovarajućih pitanja za multiHop?', 'da': 'Ved multi-hop spørgsmål besvarelsessystemer, hvordan man besvarer single-hop underspørgsmål?', 'de': 'Wissen Multi-Hop Fragebeantworter Systeme, wie man die Single-Hop Teilfragen beantwortet?', 'bg': 'Могат ли мулти-хоп системи за отговор на въпроси как да отговорят на един-хоп подвъпроси?', 'nl': 'Weten Multi-Hop vragenantwoordsystemen hoe ze de Single-Hop subvragen moeten beantwoorden?', 'id': 'Apakah Sistem Jawab Pertanyaan Multi-Hop tahu bagaimana menjawab Sub-Pertanyaan Single-Hop?', 'sw': 'Je maswali mengi ya matumaini yanaweza kujibu Mfumo wa kujibu maswali ya Juu?', 'af': 'Doen Multi-Hop Vrag Antwoord Sistemes weet hoe na antwoord die EnkelHop Subvraag?', 'ko': '퀴즈 시스템을 많이 뛰면 솔로 퀴즈를 어떻게 대답하는지 아세요?', 'fa': 'آیا سیستم\u200cهای پاسخ\u200cدهنده\u200cی سوال چند هوپ می\u200cدانند چگونه پاسخ\u200cدهنده\u200cی یک هوپ\u200cها را می\u200cدانند؟', 'am': 'ብዙ-Hop ጥያቄ የስርዓቶች መልስ እንዴት እንዲመለስ ያውቃል?', 'tr': 'Köp-Hop soragy jogap sistemalary ýeke-Hop Sub-soraglary nädip jogap bermelidigini bilýärlermi?', 'sq': 'A dinë sistemet e përgjigjes për pyetje me shumë shpresa si të përgjigjen për nënpyetjet me një shpresë?', 'bn': 'অনেক-হোপ প্রশ্ন কি সিস্টেমের উত্তর জানা যায় কিভাবে একক-হোপ সাব-প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেবে?', 'hy': 'Արդյո՞ք բազմահուսային հարցերին պատասխանող համակարգերը գիտեն, թե ինչպես պատասխանել միահուսային ենթահարցերին:', 'az': 'Multi-Hop sual cavab ver톛n sisteml톛ri t톛k-Hop Sub-suallar캼n cavab캼n캼 nec톛 bildirir?', 'et': 'Kas Multi-Hop küsimustele vastamise süsteemid teavad, kuidas vastata ühe-Hop alamküsimustele?', 'bs': 'Znaju li sistemi odgovora na pitanja koje odgovaraju na jednoHop?', 'fi': 'Osaavatko Multi-Hop kysymysvastausjĂ¤rjestelmĂ¤t vastata Single-Hop Sub-kysymyksiin?', 'cs': 'Ví systémy pro odpovědi na otázky Multi-Hop, jak odpovědět na dílčí otázky Single-Hop?', 'ca': 'Els sistemes de resposta a preguntes multiHop saben respondre a les subpreguntes single-Hop?', 'jv': 'Apane Panjenengan Multi-Job Panjenengan Sistem Panjenengan ngerti piye isah Panjenengan Single-Hop ?', 'ha': 'Do Multi-Hop Question Answering Systems Know How to Answer the Single-Hop Sub-Questions?', 'sk': 'Ali sistemi za odgovarjanje na vprašanja z več koraki vedo, kako odgovoriti na podvprašanja z enim korakom?', 'he': 'Do Multi-Hop Question Answering Systems Know How to Answer the Single-Hop Sub-Questions?', 'bo': 'སྒེར་གྱི་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མིན་འདྲི་ཞིབ་ལབ་མ་ཐུབ་པ་ལས་རང་གིས་དབང་སྒེར་གྱི་གནད་དོན་ལ་ཇི་ལྟར་ལབ་གམ།'}
{'en': 'Multi-hop question answering (QA) requires a model to retrieve and integrate information from multiple passages to answer a question. Rapid progress has been made on multi-hop QA systems with regard to standard evaluation metrics, including EM and F1. However, by simply evaluating the correctness of the answers, it is unclear to what extent these systems have learned the ability to perform multi-hop reasoning. In this paper, we propose an additional sub-question evaluation for the multi-hop QA dataset HotpotQA, in order to shed some light on explaining the reasoning process of QA systems in answering complex questions. We adopt a neural decomposition model to generate sub-questions for a multi-hop question, followed by extracting the corresponding sub-answers. Contrary to our expectation, multiple state-of-the-art multi-hop QA models fail to answer a large portion of sub-questions, although the corresponding multi-hop questions are correctly answered. Our work takes a step forward towards building a more explainable multi-hop QA system.', 'ar': 'تتطلب الإجابة على الأسئلة ذات القفزات المتعددة (QA) نموذجًا لاسترداد المعلومات ودمجها من مقاطع متعددة للإجابة على سؤال. تم إحراز تقدم سريع في أنظمة ضمان الجودة متعددة القفزات فيما يتعلق بمقاييس التقييم القياسية ، بما في ذلك EM و F1. ومع ذلك ، بمجرد تقييم صحة الإجابات ، من غير الواضح إلى أي مدى تعلمت هذه الأنظمة القدرة على أداء التفكير متعدد القفزات. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح تقييمًا إضافيًا للأسئلة الفرعية لمجموعة بيانات QA متعددة القفزات HotpotQA ، من أجل إلقاء بعض الضوء على شرح عملية التفكير لأنظمة ضمان الجودة في الإجابة على الأسئلة المعقدة. نعتمد نموذج التحلل العصبي لتوليد أسئلة فرعية لسؤال متعدد القفزات ، متبوعًا باستخراج الإجابات الفرعية المقابلة. على عكس توقعاتنا ، تفشل نماذج ضمان الجودة المتعددة الحديثة والمتعددة في الإجابة على جزء كبير من الأسئلة الفرعية ، على الرغم من الإجابة على الأسئلة ذات القفزات المتعددة بشكل صحيح. يأخذ عملنا خطوة إلى الأمام نحو بناء نظام ضمان الجودة متعدد القفزات أكثر قابلية للتفسير.', 'fr': "La réponse aux questions (AQ) à sauts multiples nécessite un modèle permettant de récupérer et d'intégrer des informations provenant de plusieurs passages afin de répondre à une question. Des progrès rapides ont été réalisés sur les systèmes d'assurance qualité à sauts multiples en ce qui concerne les métriques d'évaluation standard, y compris EM et F1. Cependant, en évaluant simplement l'exactitude des réponses, on ne sait pas dans quelle mesure ces systèmes ont appris à effectuer un raisonnement multi-sauts. Dans cet article, nous proposons une évaluation de sous-question supplémentaire pour le jeu de données d'assurance qualité multi-sauts HotPotQA, afin de clarifier le processus de raisonnement des systèmes d'assurance qualité pour répondre à des questions complexes. Nous adoptons un modèle de décomposition neuronale pour générer des sous-questions pour une question à sauts multiples, puis extrayons les sous-réponses correspondantes. Contrairement à nos attentes, plusieurs modèles d'assurance qualité multi-sauts de pointe ne répondent pas à une grande partie des sous-questions, bien que les questions multi-sauts correspondantes reçoivent une réponse correcte. Notre travail fait un pas en avant vers la création d'un système d'assurance qualité multi-sauts plus explicable.", 'pt': 'A resposta a perguntas de vários saltos (QA) requer um modelo para recuperar e integrar informações de várias passagens para responder a uma pergunta. O progresso rápido foi feito em sistemas de controle de qualidade multi-hop em relação às métricas de avaliação padrão, incluindo EM e F1. No entanto, simplesmente avaliando a exatidão das respostas, não está claro até que ponto esses sistemas aprenderam a capacidade de executar o raciocínio multi-hop. Neste artigo, propomos uma avaliação adicional de subquestões para o conjunto de dados de QA multi-hop HotpotQA, a fim de esclarecer o processo de raciocínio de sistemas de QA na resposta a perguntas complexas. Adotamos um modelo de decomposição neural para gerar sub-questões para uma pergunta multi-hop, seguida pela extração das sub-respostas correspondentes. Ao contrário de nossa expectativa, vários modelos de controle de qualidade multi-hop de última geração não respondem a uma grande parte das subquestões, embora as perguntas multi-hop correspondentes sejam respondidas corretamente. Nosso trabalho dá um passo à frente na construção de um sistema de controle de qualidade multi-hop mais explicável.', 'es': 'La respuesta a preguntas (QA) de múltiples saltos requiere un modelo para recuperar e integrar la información de varios pasajes para responder a una pregunta. Se ha avanzado rápidamente en los sistemas de control de calidad multisalto con respecto a las métricas de evaluación estándar, incluidas EM y F1. Sin embargo, simplemente evaluando la exactitud de las respuestas, no está claro hasta qué punto estos sistemas han aprendido la capacidad de realizar el razonamiento de múltiples saltos. En este artículo, proponemos una evaluación adicional de subpreguntas para el conjunto de datos de control de calidad de múltiples saltos HotpotQA, con el fin de arrojar algo de luz sobre la explicación del proceso de razonamiento de los sistemas de control de calidad al responder preguntas complejas. Adoptamos un modelo de descomposición neuronal para generar subpreguntas para una pregunta de múltiples saltos, seguido de la extracción de las respuestas secundarias correspondientes. Contrariamente a lo que esperábamos, varios modelos de control de calidad multisalto de última generación no responden a una gran parte de las subpreguntas, aunque las preguntas multisalto correspondientes se responden correctamente. Nuestro trabajo da un paso adelante hacia la creación de un sistema de control de calidad multisalto más explicable.', 'ja': 'マルチホップクエスチョンアンサー（ QA ）は、質問に答えるために、複数の経路から情報を取得して統合するためのモデルを必要とする。 EMおよびF 1を含む標準評価指標に関して、マルチホップQAシステムは急速に進歩している。 しかし、答えの正しさを評価するだけでは、これらのシステムがマルチホップ推論を実行する能力をどの程度学んだかは不明です。 本稿では，複雑な質問に答える際のQAシステムの推論過程の説明を明らかにするために，マルチホップQAデータセットHotpotQAの追加のサブ質問評価を提案する． 神経分解モデルを採用し、マルチホップクエスチョンのサブクエスチョンを生成し、対応するサブアンサーを抽出します。 期待に反して、複数の最先端のマルチホップQAモデルは、対応するマルチホップクエスチョンが正しく回答されているものの、サブクエスチョンの大部分に回答できませんでした。 私たちの仕事は、より説明可能なマルチホップQAシステムの構築に向けて一歩前進します。', 'zh': '多跳问答 (QA) 须一模检集成数段落以对。 估计指标( EM F1),多跳 QA 系统已捷进。 然略质对案之正确性,未详其统于多大程度,学能踊跃推理之能也。 本文对多跳QA据集HotpotQA发一额外子问评估,以明QA系统于答杂问之理。 用神经分解为多跳生子,然后取子答案。 与吾期相反,虽应多应得正对,而多先进者多跳 QA 不能对大半。 我们的事务朝着构建更易于解释的多跳 QA 系统出了一步。', 'ru': 'Мультихоп ответ на вопрос (QA) требует модели для извлечения и интеграции информации из нескольких отрывков, чтобы ответить на вопрос. Быстрый прогресс был достигнут в отношении многоцелевых систем обеспечения качества в том, что касается стандартных оценочных показателей, включая EM и F1. Однако, просто оценивая правильность ответов, неясно, в какой степени эти системы усвоили способность выполнять мультихоповые рассуждения. В этой статье мы предлагаем дополнительную оценку подвопроса для множественного набора данных QA HotpotQA, чтобы пролить свет на объяснение процесса аргументации систем QA при ответе на сложные вопросы. Мы принимаем модель нейронной декомпозиции для генерации подвопросов для многохопового вопроса с последующим извлечением соответствующих подвопросов. Вопреки нашим ожиданиям, несколько современных мультихоп моделей QA не могут ответить на большую часть подвопросов, хотя на соответствующие мультихоп вопросы даются правильные ответы. Наша работа делает шаг вперед к созданию более объяснимой мультихоповой системы обеспечения качества.', 'hi': 'मल्टी-हॉप प्रश्न उत्तर (क्यूए) को एक प्रश्न का उत्तर देने के लिए कई मार्गों से जानकारी को पुनर्प्राप्त करने और एकीकृत करने के लिए एक मॉडल की आवश्यकता होती है। ईएम और एफ 1 सहित मानक मूल्यांकन मैट्रिक्स के संबंध में मल्टी-हॉप क्यूए प्रणालियों पर तेजी से प्रगति की गई है। हालांकि, केवल उत्तरों की शुद्धता का मूल्यांकन करके, यह स्पष्ट नहीं है कि इन प्रणालियों ने मल्टी-हॉप तर्क करने की क्षमता को किस हद तक सीखा है। इस पेपर में, हम मल्टी-हॉप क्यूए डेटासेट हॉटपॉटक्यूए के लिए एक अतिरिक्त उप-प्रश्न मूल्यांकन का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, ताकि जटिल प्रश्नों के उत्तर देने में क्यूए सिस्टम की तर्क प्रक्रिया को समझाने पर कुछ प्रकाश डाला जा सके। हम एक बहु-हॉप प्रश्न के लिए उप-प्रश्न उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक तंत्रिका अपघटन मॉडल अपनाते हैं, इसके बाद संबंधित उप-उत्तर निकालते हैं। हमारी अपेक्षा के विपरीत, कई अत्याधुनिक मल्टी-हॉप क्यूए मॉडल उप-प्रश्नों के एक बड़े हिस्से का उत्तर देने में विफल रहते हैं, हालांकि संबंधित मल्टी-हॉप प्रश्नों का सही उत्तर दिया जाता है। हमारा काम एक अधिक स्पष्ट मल्टी-हॉप क्यूए सिस्टम के निर्माण की दिशा में एक कदम आगे बढ़ता है।', 'ga': "Teastaíonn múnla chun faisnéis a aisghabháil agus a chomhtháthú ó ilsleachta chun ceist a fhreagairt chun ceist a fhreagairt il-hop (QA). Tá dul chun cinn tapa déanta ar chórais il-hop QA maidir le méadracht chaighdeánach mheastóireachta, lena n-áirítear EM agus F1. Mar sin féin, trí chruinneas na bhfreagraí a mheas go simplí, ní léir cé chomh mór agus a d'fhoghlaim na córais seo an cumas réasúnaíocht il-hop a dhéanamh. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid meastóireacht bhreise ar fhocheisteanna don tacar sonraí il-hop QA HotpotQA, chun léargas a thabhairt ar phróiseas réasúnaíochta na gcóras QA maidir le ceisteanna casta a fhreagairt. Glacaimid múnla dianscaoilte néaraigh chun focheisteanna a ghiniúint do cheist il-hop, agus baintear na fo-fhreagraí comhfhreagracha ina dhiaidh sin. Murab ionann agus ár n-ionchais, ní éiríonn le samhlacha iomadúla il-hop QA úrscothacha cuid mhór de na focheisteanna a fhreagairt, cé go bhfreagraítear na ceisteanna il-hop comhfhreagracha i gceart. Tógann ár gcuid oibre céim ar aghaidh i dtreo córas QA il-hop níos soiléire a thógáil.", 'ka': 'მრავალ-ჰოპური კითხვის პასუხი (QA) უნდა მოდელის მიღება და ინტერგურაცია ინფორმაციის მრავალ პასუხისგან კითხვის პასუხისთვის. ბრძნელი პროგრესი გავაკეთებულია მრავალ-ჰოპური QA სისტემებში, რომელიც სტანდარტური განსაზღვრების მეტრიკის შესახებ, включая EM და F1. მაგრამ, განსხვავებების მარტივის განსაზღვრებით, არაფერი არაფერი, რამდენიმე სისტემის განსაზღვრებით ამ სისტემის შესაძლებლობა მრავალ-ჰოპის განსაზღვრებას გავისწ ამ დომენტში ჩვენ დავიწყებთ კომპლექტური QA მონაცემების HotpotQA მონაცემებისთვის დამატებული სპექტური გაუკეთება, რომ QA სისტემის პარამენტირების პროცესის გაახსნა კომპლექტური ჩვენ მივიღეთ ნეიროლური განაკომპორციციის მოდელი, რომ მრავალ-ჰოპის კითხვებისთვის შექმნა, შემდეგ კომპორცირებული სეფექტურების გამოყენება. ჩვენი განმეხოვრებისთვის, მრავალური მრავალური QA მოდელები არ შეუძლებელია გაუპასუხოთ, თუმცა მრავალური მრავალური კითხვების დიდი ნაწილი, მაგრამ შესაძლებელი მრავალური კითხვები მ ჩვენი სამუშაო უფრო უფრო განახსნავით მრავალ-ჰოპ QA სისტემა.', 'el': 'Η απάντηση πολλών ερωτήσεων απαιτεί ένα μοντέλο για να ανακτήσει και να ενσωματώσει πληροφορίες από πολλαπλά χωρία για να απαντήσει σε μια ερώτηση. Έχει σημειωθεί ταχεία πρόοδος στα συστήματα QS πολλαπλών βαθμίδων όσον αφορά τις τυποποιημένες μετρήσεις αξιολόγησης, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των EM και F1. Ωστόσο, αξιολογώντας απλώς την ορθότητα των απαντήσεων, δεν είναι σαφές σε ποιο βαθμό αυτά τα συστήματα έχουν μάθει την ικανότητα να εκτελούν συλλογισμό πολλαπλών χορού. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια συμπληρωματική αξιολόγηση υποερωτήσεων για το σύνολο δεδομένων QA πολλαπλών λυκίδων προκειμένου να ρίξουμε λίγο φως στην εξήγηση της διαδικασίας συλλογισμού των συστημάτων QA στην απάντηση σύνθετων ερωτήσεων. Υιοθετούμε ένα μοντέλο νευρικής αποσύνθεσης για να δημιουργήσουμε υποερωτήσεις για μια ερώτηση πολλαπλών χορού, ακολουθούμενη από την εξαγωγή των αντίστοιχων υποαπαντήσεων. Αντίθετα με τις προσδοκίες μας, τα πολλαπλά σύγχρονα μοντέλα QA δεν μπορούν να απαντήσουν σε ένα μεγάλο μέρος των υποερωτήσεων, αν και οι αντίστοιχες ερωτήσεις πολλαπλών hop απαντώνται σωστά. Το έργο μας κάνει ένα βήμα μπροστά προς την οικοδόμηση ενός πιο εξηγημένου συστήματος QA πολλαπλών βημάτων.', 'hu': 'A multi-hop kérdésre adott válasz (QA) modellre van szükség ahhoz, hogy több részből származó információkat szerezzen és integráljon egy kérdésre adott választ. Gyors előrelépés történt a multi-hop minősítési rendszerek terén a szabványos értékelési mutatók tekintetében, beleértve az EM-t és az F1-t is. A válaszok helyességének egyszerű értékelésével azonban nem világos, hogy ezek a rendszerek milyen mértékben tanulták meg a multi-hop érvelés képességét. Jelen tanulmányban további alkérdések értékelését javasoljuk a HotpotQA multi-hop minőségbiztosítási adatkészlethez, annak érdekében, hogy rávilágítsunk a minőségbiztosítási rendszerek érvelési folyamatára a komplex kérdések megválaszolása során. Egy neurális bomlási modellt alkalmazunk, hogy kérdéseket generáljunk egy multi-hop kérdéshez, majd kinyerjük a megfelelő részválaszokat. Az elvárásainkkal ellentétben a több korszerű multi-hop minősítési modell nem válaszol a kérdések nagy részére, bár a megfelelő multi-hop kérdésekre helyesen válaszolnak. Munkánk egy lépést tesz előre egy megmagyarázhatóbb multi-hop minősítési rendszer kiépítése felé.', 'it': "La risposta alle domande multi-hop (QA) richiede un modello per recuperare e integrare informazioni da più passaggi per rispondere a una domanda. Sono stati fatti rapidi progressi sui sistemi di QA multi-hop per quanto riguarda le metriche di valutazione standard, tra cui EM e F1. Tuttavia, semplicemente valutando la correttezza delle risposte, non è chiaro in che misura questi sistemi abbiano imparato la capacità di eseguire ragionamenti multi-hop. In questo articolo, proponiamo un'ulteriore valutazione sotto-domanda per il set di dati multi-hop QA HotpotQA, al fine di chiarire il processo di ragionamento dei sistemi QA nella risposta a domande complesse. Adottiamo un modello di decomposizione neurale per generare sotto-domande per una domanda multi-hop, seguita dall'estrazione delle sotto-risposte corrispondenti. Contrariamente alle nostre aspettative, i modelli QA multi-hop all'avanguardia non rispondono a una gran parte di sotto-domande, anche se le corrispondenti domande multi-hop ricevono una risposta corretta. Il nostro lavoro fa un passo avanti verso la costruzione di un sistema QA multi-hop più spiegabile.", 'lt': 'Atsakymui į daugialypį klausimą (QA) reikia modelio, pagal kurį informacija būtų gaunama ir integruojama iš kelių posėdžių, kad būtų galima atsakyti į klausimą. Greita pažanga padaryta daugiapakopių QA sistemų srityje, atsižvelgiant į standartinius vertinimo rodiklius, įskaitant EM ir F1. Tačiau paprasčiausiai vertinant atsakymų teisingumą neaišku, kokiu mastu šios sistemos sužinojo gebėjimą atlikti daugialypį pagrindimą. Šiame dokumente siūlome papildomą daugiapakopio QA duomenų rinkinio „HotpotQA“ pakartotinį klausimų vertinimą, kad būtų galima šiek tiek paaiškinti QA sistemų motyvavimo procesą atsakant į sudėtingus klausimus. Priimame neurologinio susiskaidymo model į, kuriame atsiranda klausimų, susijusių su daugialypiu klausimu, ir po to gauname atitinkamus atsakymus. Priešingai nei tikimės, daugelis naujausių daugiapakopių QA modelių neatsako į didelę dalį paklausimų, nors atitinkami daugiapakopiai klausimai yra teisingai atsakyti. Mūsų darbas žengia žingsnį į priekį kuriant aiškesnę daugiapakopę QA sistemą.', 'kk': 'Көп- хоп сұрақ (QA) жауап беру үшін бірнеше парақтардан мәліметті алу және біріктіру үшін моделі талап етеді. Көп-хоп QA жүйелерінде стандартты бағалау метрикалық, EM және F1 жүйелерінде тез жұмыс істеді. Бірақ, жауаптардың дұрыстығын бағалап, бұл жүйелердің көп-хоп сезімдерін қанша көп қадамдығын үйренгені білмейді. Бұл қағазда біз көп-хоп QA деректер setі HotpotQA үшін қосымша суб- сұранысты бағалау үшін QA жүйелердің түсініктеме процесін жауап беру үшін бірнеше жарықты түсініп береміз. Біз көп-хоп сұрақтарын жасау үшін невралдық бөлімдеу үлгісін келтіреміз. Сонымен қатар сұрақтардың ішкі сұрақтарын құрамыз. Біздің күтпегенімізге қарсы, көптеген көптеген көптеген көптеген QA үлгілерінің көптеген суроптардың үлкен бөлігіне жауап бермейді, бірақ сұрақтар дұрыс жауап берілген көптеген көпт Біздің жұмысамыз көп-хоп QA жүйесін жасау үшін алдыңғы қадам алды.', 'mk': 'На одговорот на повеќе прашања (QA) се бара модел за собирање и интеграција на информациите од повеќе премини за одговор на прашањето. Брз напредок е постигнат во системите на мултихоп QA во однос на стандардната метрика на оценка, вклучително и ЕМ и Ф1. Сепак, со едноставна оценка на точноста на одговорите, не е јасно во каков степен овие системи ја научија способноста да извршат мултихоп размислување. Во овој документ, предложуваме дополнителна оценка на подпрашањата за мнозинствениот комплекс на податоци за QA HotpotQA, со цел да објасниме нешто за објаснувањето на процесот на размислување на QA системите во одговорот на комплексни прашања. Ние усвоуваме модел на нервна декомпозиција за генерирање на подпрашања за прашање со мултихоп, по што следи извлекувањето на соодветните пододговори. Во спротивност на нашите очекувања, многуте најсовремени модели на мултихоп QA не одговараат на голем дел од подпрашањата, иако соодветните мултихоп прашања се исправно одговорени. Нашата работа презема чекор напред кон изградба на пообјаснлив систем на мултихоп квалитет.', 'ms': 'Jawapan soalan berbilang-lompat (QA) memerlukan model untuk mendapatkan dan integrasikan maklumat dari beberapa laluan untuk menjawab soalan. Kecapaian cepat telah dilakukan pada sistem QA multi-hop berkaitan dengan metrik penilaian piawai, termasuk EM dan F1. However, by simply evaluating the correctness of the answers, it is unclear to what extent these systems have learned the ability to perform multi-hop reasoning.  Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan penilaian sub-soalan tambahan untuk set data QA multi-hop HotpotQA, untuk memberikan beberapa cahaya kepada menjelaskan proses alasan sistem QA dalam menjawab soalan kompleks. Kami mengadopsi model penyahkomposisi saraf untuk menghasilkan sub-soalan untuk soalan multi-hop, diikuti dengan mengekstrak sub-jawapan yang sepadan. Berlawan dengan harapan kita, model QA multi-hop state-of-the-art berbilang gagal menjawab sebahagian besar sub-soalan, walaupun soalan multi-hop yang sepadan dijawab dengan betul. Kerja kami mengambil langkah ke hadapan untuk membina sistem QA multi-hop yang lebih jelas.', 'ml': 'ഒരു ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം ചോദിക്കാന്\u200d പല പാസേജുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വിവരം ലഭ്യമാക്കാനും ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്. സാധാരണ evaluation മെട്രിക്കുകളുടെ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d പല-ഹോപ്പ് ക്യൂഎ സിസ്റ്റമില്\u200d റാപിഡ് പുരോഗമുണ്ടാക്കി എന്നാലും മറുപടികളുടെ ശരിയാണെന്ന് നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നത് കൊണ്ട്, ഈ സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200d പല-ഹോപ്പിന്റെ കാരണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ക്യൂഎ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് ഹോട്പ്പോട്ട്ക്യൂഎയുടെ പ്രക്രിയയെ വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d കുറച്ച് വെളിച്ചമുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. ക്യൂഎ സിസ്റ്റുകളു നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ന്യൂറല്\u200d ഡെക്കോമോപ്പിസ്റ്റ് മോഡല്\u200d എടുക്കുന്നു. അതിനുശേഷം സബ് ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടി ഒരു  നമ്മുടെ പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി വിരോധമാണ്, ഒരുപാട് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഹോപ്പ് ക്യൂഎ മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകാന്\u200d കഴിയില്ല നമ്മുടെ ജോലി മുന്നോട്ട് പോകുന്നു. കൂടുതല്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്ന പല-ഹോപ്പ് ക്യൂഎ സിസ്റ്', 'mt': "Multi-hop question answering (QA) requires a model to retrieve and integrate information from multiple passages to answer a question.  Sar progress rapidu fis-sistemi ta’ QA b’ħafna ħops fir-rigward tal-metriċi standard ta’ evalwazzjoni, inklużi l-EM u l-F1. Madankollu, billi tiġi vvalutata sempliċement il-korrettezza tat-tweġibiet, mhuwiex ċar sa liema punt dawn is-sistemi għallmu l-kapaċit à li jwettqu raġunament multi hop. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu evalwazzjoni addizzjonali ta’ sottomistoqsijiet għas-sett ta’ dejta tal-QA b’ħafna hops HotpotQA, sabiex nispjegaw xi dawl fuq l-ispjegazzjoni tal-proċess ta’ raġunament tas-sistemi tal-QA fit-tweġiba għal mistoqsijiet kumplessi. Aħna niddottaw mudell ta’ dekompożizzjoni newrali biex niġġeneraw sottomistoqsijiet għal mistoqsija b’ħafna ħops, segwita mill-estrazzjoni tas-sottotweġibiet korrispondenti. Contrary to our expectation, multiple state-of-the-art multi-hop QA models fail to answer a large portion of sub-questions, although the corresponding multi-hop questions are correctly answered.  Ix-xogħol tagħna qed jieħu pass 'il quddiem lejn il-bini ta' sistema ta' QA b'ħafna hops aktar spjegabbli.", 'pl': 'Odpowiedzi na pytania w wielu przypadkach (QA) wymagają modelu pobierania i integracji informacji z wielu fragmentów, aby odpowiedzieć na pytanie. Poczyniono szybkie postępy w zakresie wieloosobowych systemów jakości w zakresie standardowych wskaźników oceny, w tym EM i F1. Jednak oceniając poprawność odpowiedzi, nie jest jasne, w jakim stopniu systemy te nauczyły się umiejętności wykonywania rozumowania multi-hop. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy dodatkową ocenę podpytań dla wieloskojowego zbioru danych HotpotQA, aby rzucić trochę światła na wyjaśnienie procesu rozumowania systemów QA w odpowiedzi na złożone pytania. Przyjmujemy model rozkładu neuronowego, aby generować podpytania dla pytania multi-hop, a następnie wyodrębnić odpowiednie pododpowiedzi. Wbrew naszym oczekiwaniom, wiele najnowocześniejszych modeli multi-hop QA nie udaje się odpowiedzieć na dużą część podpytań, chociaż odpowiadające im pytania multi-hop są poprawnie odpowiedziane. Nasza praca jest krokiem naprzód w kierunku budowy bardziej wyjaśnionego multi-hop systemu jakości.', 'mn': 'Олон холбоотой асуулт хариулт (QA) нь асуултын хариултаар олон загвараас мэдээллийг авах, нэгтгэх загвар хэрэгтэй. EM болон F1 гэх мэт стандарт дүгнэлтийн метрийн тухай олон холбоотой QA системийн хурдан хөгжлийг хийгдсэн. Гэвч, хариултын зөв байдлыг үнэлэхээр эдгээр системүүд олон холбоотой ойлголт хийх чадварыг хэрхэн сурсан вэ гэдгийг мэдэхгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон холбоотой QA өгөгдлийн сангийн HotpotQA дээр нэмэлт суб-асуултын үнэлгээ санал болгож, QA системийн шалтгааныг тодорхойлох боломжтой гэрэл гаргаж байна. Бид олон холбоотой асуултын суб-асуултыг бий болгоход мэдрэлийн хуваагдах загварыг ашиглаж, хариулттай суб-хариултыг гаргаж ирсэн. Бидний хүлээн зөвхөн олон урлагийн олон холбоотой QA загварууд суб-асуултын ихэнх хэсэгт хариулт өгч чадахгүй. Харин холбоотой олон холбоотой асуултууд зөв хариулт өгч чадахгүй. Бидний ажил илүү ойлгомжтой олон холбоотой QA системийг бүтээхэд урагш явдаг.', 'ro': 'Răspunsul la întrebări multi-hop (QA) necesită un model pentru a recupera și a integra informații din mai multe pasaje pentru a răspunde la o întrebare. S-au înregistrat progrese rapide în ceea ce privește sistemele de calitate multi-hop în ceea ce privește măsurătorile standard de evaluare, inclusiv EM și F1. Cu toate acestea, prin simpla evaluare a corectitudinii răspunsurilor, este neclar în ce măsură aceste sisteme au învățat capacitatea de a efectua raționament multi-hop. În această lucrare, propunem o evaluare suplimentară a subîntrebărilor pentru setul de date QA multi-hop HotpotQA, pentru a face o lumină asupra explicării procesului de raționament al sistemelor QA în răspunsul la întrebări complexe. Adoptăm un model de descompunere neurală pentru a genera subîntrebări pentru o întrebare multi-hop, urmată de extragerea subrăspunsurilor corespunzătoare. Contrar așteptărilor noastre, modelele QA multi-hop de ultimă generație nu reușesc să răspundă la o mare parte de sub-întrebări, deși întrebările multi-hop corespunzătoare au răspuns corect. Activitatea noastră face un pas înainte către construirea unui sistem de calitate multi-hop mai explicabil.', 'no': 'Svar på fleire hopp- spørsmål (QA) krev eit modell for å henta og integrera informasjon frå fleire passar for å svara på eit spørsmål. Snøggframdring er gjort på fleirhopp QA-systemet med hensyn til standard evalueringsmetrikar, inkludert EM og F1. Men ved å vurdere rettigheten av svara er det ikkje klart til kor mykje desse systema har lært på at det kan utføre fleirhopp-rasjon. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein ekstra underspørsmålsevaluering for multihopp QA-dataset HotpotQA, for å slå litt lys på å forklare rasjonsprosessen av QA-systemet i svar på komplekse spørsmål. Vi adopterer eit neuraldekomposisjonsmodell for å laga underspørsmål for eit fleirhopp spørsmål, etter å pakka ut dei tilsvarande undersvara. I motsetning til vårt forventing kan fleire mønsterelementar av kunsten ikkje svara på ein stor del av underspørsmål, selv om dei tilsvarande fleirhoppsspørsmålene er rett svarte. Arbeidet vårt tar ein steg framover mot å bygge eit meir forklarbare multihopp QA-system.', 'so': "Jawaalka su'aalaha badan (QA) waxaa loola baahan yahay tusaale in laga helo macluumaadka baasabooyinka kala duduwan si ay uga jawaabo su'aal. QA nidaamka badan ee QA waxaa lagu sameeyay horumarinta rapid, kuwaas oo ka mid ah EM iyo F1. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, qiimeynta saxda jawaabaha, ma ahan in nidaamkan ay bartaan awoodda sameynta sababta badan. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa qiimeynta hoos-su'aal oo kale ee QA-ka soo saara macluumaadka HotpotQA, si aan u soo saarno fudud si loo caddeeyo nidaamka qasabka ah ee QA ka jawaabo su'aalaha adag. Waxaynu qaadannaa model daboolka neurada ah si aan u soo saarno su'aalo hoos-hoos ah, taas oo lagu soo bixiyo jawaabaha sub-hop. Isku xiriirta rajadayada, noocyada farshaxanka badan ee QA ayaa ka jawaabi kari waayay su'aalo badan, in kastoo ay u jawaabaan su'aalaha hoose-hop si saxda ah. Shuqulkayagu wuxuu hore u qaadanayaa dhismaha nidaamka QA oo kala duduwan.", 'sv': 'Multi-hop frågesvar (QA) kräver en modell för att hämta och integrera information från flera passager för att svara på en fråga. Snabba framsteg har gjorts på multi-hop QA-system med avseende på standardutvärderingsmetoder, inklusive EM och F1. Men genom att helt enkelt utvärdera svarens korrekthet är det oklart i vilken utsträckning dessa system har lärt sig förmågan att utföra multi-hop resonemang. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en ytterligare underfrågeutvärdering för multi-hop QA datauppsättningen HotpotQA, för att belysa resonemanget av QA-system för att besvara komplexa frågor. Vi antar en neural nedbrytningsmodell för att generera underfrågor för en multi-hop fråga, följt av att extrahera motsvarande undersvar. I motsats till vår förväntan svarar flera toppmoderna QA-modeller inte på en stor del av underfrågorna, även om motsvarande multi-hop-frågor besvaras korrekt. Vårt arbete tar ett steg framåt mot att bygga ett mer förklarande multi-hop QA system.', 'sr': 'Odgovor na više-hopova pitanja (QA) zahteva model da se prikupi i integriše informacije iz višestrukih prolaza za odgovor na pitanje. Brzi napredak je postignut na multihopski QA sistemi u odnosu na standardne procjene metrike, uključujući EM i F1. Međutim, jednostavno procjenjivanjem ispravnosti odgovora, nije jasno koliko su ovi sistemi naučili sposobnost izvršavanja multihopskog razuma. U ovom papiru predlažemo dodatnu procjenu podpitanja za multihopsku QA dataset HotpotQA, kako bi se malo osvetilo objašnjavanju razumnog procesa QA sistema u odgovoru na složena pitanja. Usvojimo model neuralnog raskidanja kako bi stvorili podpitanja za multihopsko pitanje, nakon što izvlačimo odgovarajuće pododgovore. Pored našeg očekivanja, više modela umjetnosti multi hop a QA ne odgovaraju na veliku deo podpitanja, iako odgovaraju odgovarajuća multihopska pitanja ispravno odgovaraju. Naš rad preduzima korak napred ka izgradnji objašnjivijeg multihopskog QA sistema.', 'si': 'Multi-Hop ප්\u200dරශ්න උත්තර (QA) අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් උත්තර දෙන්න සහ සම්බන්ධ කරන්න මොඩල් එකක් අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා. ඉක්මනික විශ්වාසයෙන් EM සහ F1 සමග විශ්වාසයෙන් ඉක්මනික විශ්වාසයෙන් ඉක්මනික විධානය කළා. නමුත්, ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සිද්ධ විශ්වාස කරන්න, මේ පද්ධතියේ කොච්චර ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ඉගෙන ගත්තා කියලා ගොඩක් හොප් හොයාග මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්නේ වැඩි හොප් QA දත්ත සැට HotpotQA ගැන විශ්වාස කරන්න, QA පද්ධතියේ හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න න්\u200dයූරල් විස්තරයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙන්න, පස්සේ සම්බන්ධ උප අපේ බලාපොරොත්තුවට විරුද්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතික්ෂා කරන්න බැරි වුනා, ඒත් සම්බන්ධ විශාල අපේ වැඩේ ඉදිරියට පැත්තක් වෙනවා විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් ගොඩක් හොප් QA පද්ධතියක්.', 'ta': 'Multi-hop question answering (QA) requires a model to retrieve and integrate information from multiple passages to answer a question.  நிலையான evaluation metrics, EM மற்றும் F1 உடன், பல- hop QA அமைப்புகளில் ராபிட் முன்னேற்றம் செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது. ஆனால், விடைகளின் சரியை மதிப்பீடு செய்வதால், இந்த அமைப்புகள் பல-hop காரணங்களை செய்ய எவ்வளவு அளவில் கற்றுக் கொண்டிருக்கிறார்கள் என இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் கூடுதல் துணை கேள்வி மதிப்பிடுதலை முன்நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம் பல- ஹாப் கியூஏ தகவல் பொட்ட்பாட்கியாவிற்கு, சில ஒளியை வெளிப் துணை கேள்விகளை உருவாக்க நாம் ஒரு புதிய துணை குறிப்பிடும் மாதிரி எடுத்து, பின்னர் பொருத்தமான துணை பதில்களை வெளியேற்றும். எங்கள் எதிர்பார்ப்புக்கு எதிர்பார்க்கப்படுகிறது, பல- கலை மாநிலையில் பல- ஹாப் கியூஏ மாதிரிகள் பெரிய துணை கேள்விகளுக்கு பதில் தோல்வியடை எங்கள் வேலை முன்னே ஒரு படி எடுத்துக் கொண்டு மேலும் விளக்கமுடியாத பல-hop QA அமைப்பை உருவாக்குவதற்கு.', 'ur': 'Multi-hop سوال جواب (QA) کے لئے ایک موڈل کی ضرورت ہے کہ ایک سوال کے جواب کے لئے بہت سی پاسٹوں سے معلومات حاصل کرنے اور جمع کرنے کے لئے۔ EM اور F1 کے شامل استاندارڈ ارزیابی میٹریک کے بارے میں بہت سے ہپ کی سیستموں پر تیز پیشرفت کی گئی ہے. However, by simply evaluating the correct answers, it is unclear as to how extent these systems have learned the ability to perform multi-hop reasoning. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک اضافہ زیادہ سؤال کا ارزیابہ کریں گے multi-hop QA ڈاٹ سٹ HotpotQA کے لئے، اس لئے کہ QA سیستم کے منطقی پروسس کو مشخص کرنے کے لئے کچھ نور ڈال دیں۔ ہم ایک نئورل بٹانٹ موڈل کو قبول کرتے ہیں کہ ایک multi-hop سؤال کے لئے sub-سوال پیدا کریں، اس کے بعد اس کے مطابق مطابق زیب-جواب نکالیں. ہماری انتظار کے مقابلہ میں، بہت سی ایٹیٹ multi-hop QA موڈل ایک بہت سی سؤال کا جواب نہیں دیتے، اگرچہ مختلف multi-hop سؤال ٹھیک جواب دیئے جاتے ہیں. ہمارا کام ایک قدم آگے چلتا ہے ایک زیادہ توضیح دینے والی multi-hop QA سیستم بنانے کی طرف۔', 'uz': "Name Name Lekin, oddiy javoblarning to ʻgʻri haqida qiymatda, bu tizimlar bir necha ko'plab-hop sabablarni bajarishga o'rganishga yetarlicha emas. Bu qogʻozda, biz QA haqida murakkab savollarni javob berish uchun bir necha koʻproq QA maʼlumot yozuvchi qiymatni qo'shib beramiz. Biz bir ko'plab savollarni yaratish uchun neyrolik dekompozning modelini qo'llamiz, keyin tub javoblarni ajratish mumkin. Bizning kutilgan holatimizga murakkablik, ko'pchilik sohalar QA modellarining ko'pchilik soʻzlariga javob bermadi, ammo ko'pchilik mulhop savollariga javob beradi. Bizning ishimiz bir necha ko'proq QA tizimini yaratish uchun bir qadam oldin.", 'vi': 'Việc trả lời câu hỏi đa hop đòi hỏi một kiểu mẫu để lấy và nhập thông tin từ nhiều đoạn để trả lời câu hỏi. Đã có tiến triển nhanh trong hệ thống QA đa hop với giá trị đo chuẩn, bao gồm EM và F1. Tuy nhiên, chỉ bằng cách đánh giá sự chính xác của câu trả lời, không rõ là những hệ thống này đã học được khả năng phân tích đa ngành. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một cuộc đánh giá phụ cấp thêm cho tập tin nóng nóng nóng bỏng của QA, để dễ dàng giải thích quá trình lập luận của hệ thống QA trong việc trả lời các câu hỏi phức tạp hơn. Chúng tôi sử dụng một mô hình phân hủy thần kinh để tạo ra các chi nhánh cho một câu hỏi đa hop, sau đó lấy được các câu trả lời phụ tương ứng. Trái với mong đợi của chúng ta, nhiều mẫu mã đa nhà hàng không thể trả lời được một phần lớn các câu hỏi phụ, mặc dù câu hỏi đa hop tương ứng vẫn được trả lời đúng. Công việc của chúng tôi tiến triển hơn về việc xây dựng một hệ thống QA đa leo trèo.', 'nl': 'Multi-hop question responsing (QA) vereist een model om informatie uit meerdere passages op te halen en te integreren om een vraag te beantwoorden. Er is snelle vooruitgang geboekt met multi-hop QA-systemen met betrekking tot standaard evaluatiestatistieken, waaronder EM en F1. Door simpelweg de juistheid van de antwoorden te evalueren, is het echter onduidelijk in hoeverre deze systemen het vermogen hebben geleerd om multi-hop redeneren uit te voeren. In dit artikel stellen we een aanvullende subvraag evaluatie voor de multi-hop QA dataset HotpotQA voor, om wat licht te werpen op het redeneren proces van QA systemen bij het beantwoorden van complexe vragen. We gebruiken een neuraal decompositiemodel om subvragen te genereren voor een multi-hop vraag, gevolgd door het extraheren van de overeenkomstige subantwoorden. In tegenstelling tot onze verwachting kunnen meerdere state-of-the-art multi-hop QA modellen een groot deel van subvragen niet beantwoorden, hoewel de bijbehorende multi-hop vragen correct worden beantwoord. Ons werk zet een stap voorwaarts in de richting van een meer uitlegbaar multi-hop QA systeem.', 'da': 'Multi-hop spørgsmål besvarelse (QA) kræver en model til at hente og integrere oplysninger fra flere passager for at besvare et spørgsmål. Der er gjort hurtige fremskridt på multi-hop QA-systemer med hensyn til standard evalueringsmålinger, herunder EM og F1. Men ved blot at vurdere rigtigheden af svarene er det uklart, i hvilket omfang disse systemer har lært evnen til at udføre multi-hop ræsonnement. I denne artikel foreslår vi en yderligere underspørgsmålsevaluering for multi-hop QA datasættet HotpotQA, for at kaste lidt lys over forklaringen af ræsonneringsprocessen i QA-systemer i besvarelse af komplekse spørgsmål. Vi anvender en neural nedbrydningsmodel til at generere underspørgsmål til et multi-hop spørgsmål, efterfulgt af at udtrække de tilsvarende undersvar. I modsætning til vores forventning, mangler flere state-of-the-art multi-hop QA modeller ikke at besvare en stor del af underspørgsmål, selvom de tilsvarende multi-hop spørgsmål besvares korrekt. Vores arbejde tager et skridt fremad i retning af at opbygge et mere forklareligt multi-hop QA system.', 'bg': 'Отговарянето на въпроси с няколко стъпки изисква модел за извличане и интегриране на информация от множество пасажи, за да отговори на въпрос. Постигнат е бърз напредък по отношение на системите за оценка на качеството с множество хопове по отношение на стандартните показатели за оценка, включително EM и F1. Въпреки това, чрез просто оценка на точността на отговорите, не е ясно до каква степен тези системи са научили способността да изпълняват мулти-хоп разсъждения. В настоящата статия предлагаме допълнителна оценка на подвъпрос за многохоповия набор от данни за оценка на качеството с цел да хвърлим малко светлина върху обяснението на процеса на разсъждение на системите за контрол на качеството при отговор на сложни въпроси. Приемаме модел на невронно разлагане, за да генерираме подвъпроси за въпрос с мулти-хоп, последван от извличане на съответните подотговори. Противно на очакванията ни, множество съвременни мулти-хоп модели не успяват да отговорят на голяма част от подвъпросите, въпреки че съответните мулти-хоп въпроси са правилно отговорени. Работата ни прави крачка напред към изграждането на по-обяснима система за контрол на качеството с мулти-хоп.', 'hr': 'Odgovor na višehopično pitanje (QA) zahtijeva model za prikupljanje i integraciju informacija iz višestrukih prolaza za odgovor na pitanje. Brzi napredak je postignut u višehopičnim QA sustavima u odnosu na standardne procjene metrike, uključujući EM i F1. Međutim, jednostavno procjenjivanjem ispravnosti odgovora, nije jasno u kolikoj mjeri ovi sustavi naučili sposobnost izvršavanja multihopskog razuma. U ovom papiru predlažemo dodatnu procjenu podpitanja za multihopski QA dataset HotpotQA, kako bi se malo svjetlo objašnjavao razumljiv proces QA sustava u odgovoru na složena pitanja. Usvojimo model neuralnog rasključenja kako bi stvorili podpitanja za multihopsko pitanje, nakon što izvlačimo odgovarajuće pododgovore. Za razliku od našeg očekivanja, višestruki modeli umjetnosti multi hop a QA ne odgovaraju na veliki dio podpitanja, iako odgovaraju odgovarajuća multihopska pitanja ispravno odgovaraju. Naš rad preduzima korak naprijed prema izgradnji objašnjivijeg multihopskog QA sustava.', 'de': 'Multi-Hop Question Responsing (QA) erfordert ein Modell, um Informationen aus mehreren Passagen abzurufen und zu integrieren, um eine Frage zu beantworten. Bei Multi-Hop-Qualitätssicherungssystemen wurden rasche Fortschritte in Bezug auf Standardbewertungsmetriken, einschließlich EM und F1, erzielt. Durch die einfache Bewertung der Richtigkeit der Antworten ist jedoch unklar, inwieweit diese Systeme die Fähigkeit gelernt haben, Multi-Hop-Argumentation durchzuführen. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine zusätzliche Sub-Question Evaluation für den Multi-Hop QA Datensatz HotpotQA vor, um den Argumentationsprozess von QA Systemen bei der Beantwortung komplexer Fragen zu erklären. Wir verwenden ein neuronales Zerlegungsmodell, um Teilfragen für eine Multi-Hop-Frage zu generieren, gefolgt von der Extraktion der entsprechenden Teilantworten. Entgegen unserer Erwartung können mehrere hochmoderne Multi-Hop-QA-Modelle einen großen Teil der Teilfragen nicht beantworten, obwohl die entsprechenden Multi-Hop-Fragen korrekt beantwortet werden. Unsere Arbeit geht einen Schritt vorwärts in Richtung eines erklärbareren Multi-Hop QA-Systems.', 'fa': 'پاسخ سوال چندین هوپ (QA) نیاز به یک مدل است که اطلاعات را از چندین عبور برای پاسخ یک سوال بگیرد و جمع کند. پیشرفت سریع در سیستم\u200cهای چند هوپ QA در مورد متریک ارزیابی استاندارد، شامل EM و F1، انجام شده است. با این حال، با ارزیابی درستی جواب\u200cها، به چه اندازه این سیستم\u200cها توانایی انجام منطقی چند هپ یاد گرفته\u200cاند، مشخص نیست. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک ارزیابی زیر سوال بیشتری برای مجموعه داده\u200cهای QA HotpotQA برای توضیح فرآیند منطقی سیستم QA در پاسخ سوال پیچیده\u200cها را بفرستیم. ما یک مدل جدا شدن عصبی را برای تولید سوال زیر\u200cهاپ برای سوال چندین\u200cهاپ قبول می\u200cکنیم، پس از اخراج پاسخ\u200cهای زیر\u200cهاپ متعلق است. در مقابل انتظار ما، مدل های چندین حالت هنر چندین هوپ QA به پاسخ بسیاری از سوالات زیر پاسخ نمی دهند، اگرچه سوالات چندین هوپ متعلق به درستی جواب داده می شوند. کارمون يه قدم به سمت ساختن يه سيستم بيشتر توضيح قابل توضيح بيشتر از چند هپ QA پيش ميره', 'sw': 'Majibu ya maswali mengi (QA) yanahitaji mtindo wa kupata na kuunganisha taarifa kutoka kwa njia mbalimbali ili kujibu swali. Maendeleo ya mabomu yametengenezwa katika mfumo wa mifumo mbalimbali wa QA kuhusiana na mbinu za kawaida za uchunguzi, ikiwa ni pamoja na EM na F1. Hata hivyo, kwa kutathmini ukweli wa majibu, si wazi kwa kiasi gani mfumo huu umejifunza uwezo wa kutekeleza sababu za watu wengi. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza tathmini zaidi ya mfumo wa maswali kwa ajili ya seti ya data yenye jumla za QA, ili kutoa nuru kuhusu kuelezea mchakato wa maana wa mfumo wa QA katika kujibu maswali magumu. Tunaweza kuchagua mtindo wa kuanguka kwa urais wa kutengeneza maswali ya subira kwa maswali ya watu wengi, baada ya kuondoa majibu yanayofanana. Tofauti na matarajio yetu, mifano mingi ya aina ya sanaa ya QA imeshindwa kujibu sehemu kubwa ya maswali ya subira, ingawa maswali yanayomilikiwa na watu wengi yanajibiwa sahihi. Kazi yetu inachukua hatua mbele ya kutengeneza mfumo wa QA unaoelezea zaidi.', 'ko': '다중 퀴즈 (QA) 는 여러 단락에서 온 정보를 검색하고 통합해서 질문에 대답하는 모델이 필요하다.EM과 F1을 포함한 표준 평가 지표에서 멀티 점프 QA 시스템은 빠른 진전을 거두었다.그러나 답안의 정확성을 간단하게 평가함으로써 이 시스템들이 얼마나 많은 추리를 수행하는 능력을 배웠는지 알 수 없다.본고에서 우리는 QA 데이터 집합인 HotpotQA를 많이 뛰기 위해 추가적인 하위 문제 평가를 제시하여 QA 시스템이 복잡한 문제에 대답할 때의 추리 과정을 설명한다.우리는 신경분해 모델을 이용하여 다중 점프 문제를 서브 문제로 만들고 해당하는 서브 답안을 추출한다.우리의 예상과 반대로 여러 개의 가장 선진적인 다중 점프 QA모델은 대부분 분자 문제에 대답할 수 없다. 비록 상응하는 다중 점프 문제가 정확한 대답을 얻었지만.우리의 업무는 설명하기 쉬운 다중 점프 QA 시스템을 구축하는 데 한 걸음 나아갔다.', 'id': 'Jawaban pertanyaan multi-hop (QA) membutuhkan model untuk mengambil dan mengintegrasikan informasi dari beberapa kalimat untuk menjawab pertanyaan. Rapid progress has been made on multi-hop QA systems with regard to standard evaluation metrics, including EM and F1.  Namun, dengan meremehkan persis jawaban, tidak jelas seberapa tinggi sistem ini telah belajar kemampuan untuk melakukan pemikiran multi-hop. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan evaluasi sub-pertanyaan tambahan untuk dataset QA multi-hop HotpotQA, untuk memberikan beberapa cahaya pada menjelaskan proses alasan sistem QA dalam menjawab pertanyaan kompleks. Kami mengadopsi model dekomposisi saraf untuk menghasilkan sub-pertanyaan untuk pertanyaan multi-hop, diikuti dengan ekstraksi sub-jawaban yang sesuai. Berbeda dengan harapan kita, beberapa model QA multi-hop state-of-the-art gagal menjawab sebagian besar dari sub-pertanyaan, meskipun pertanyaan multi-hop yang cocok dijawab dengan benar. Pekerjaan kami mengambil langkah ke depan untuk membangun sistem QA multi-hop yang lebih jelas.', 'am': 'የብዙ-hop ጥያቄ መልስ (QA) ጥያቄን ለመመልስ ምርጫዎችን ለማግኘት እና ከመጠየቅ ምርጫዎች መረጃዎችን ለማግኘት ያስፈልጋል። የ.አ.አ.አ ነገር ግን የመልሱን አካሄዱን በማስተካከል፣ እነዚህ ሲስተማሮች ብዙዎች የጦማር ጉዳይ ማድረግ እንዴት እንደተማሩ አይገለጽም፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የQA ድምፅ ጥያቄን ለመቀበል በብዙ-ጃፍ የQA ዳታ አካባቢ ቅድሚያ ማረጋገጫ እናስባለን፡፡ ጥያቄን ለመፍጠር የደዌብ አካባቢ የጥያቄን ምሳሌ እናስወግዳለን፡፡ በተስፋታችን ላይ፣ የብዙ አካባቢ-አካባቢ የQA ዓይነቶች ብዙዎች የጥያቄ ጥያቄዎችን በመመልስ አይችሉም፤ ብዙዎች የብዙ-ጃፍ ጥያቄዎች ቢመለሱ ግን ጥያቄ በመልካም ይመልሳሉ፡፡ ሥራችን የሚለይ ብዙዎች የQA ስርዓት መሥራት ለመግለጽ የሚችል ደረጃን ወደፊት ይሄዳል፡፡', 'tr': 'Köp-Hop soragy jogaplamak (QA) bir soragy jogaplamak üçin bir nusga almak we maglumaty gatnaşmak üçin bir nusga gerek. Çalt ilerleme standart deňlenme metrikleri we EM we F1 bilen çoklu-Hop QA sistemlerinde edildi. Fakat bu sistemlerin çoklu Hop mantıklarını başarmak başarısına ulaşan şekilde birden bilmez. Bu kağıt içinde, çoklu-Hop QA veri seti HotpotQA için ek altı soru değerlendirmesini teklif ediyoruz ki, bu şekilde QA sistemlerinin karmaşık sorularına cevap vermek için biraz ışık açıklamak için bir şekilde hedef alıyoruz. Birnäçe-Hop soragy üçin sub-soraglary döretmek üçin näyral taýýarlama modelini kabul edýäris, onuň ardynda täsirli sub-jogablary a çarak yzarlar. Biziň garaşymyzyň ýakynda, sanat multi-hop QA nusgalaryň köp bölegine jogap bermegi mümkin däldir, eger täsirli multi-hop soraglaryň dogry jogap berilýär. Biziň işimiz köp-hop QA sistemasyny bejermek üçin öňünde bir adım ileri gidýär.', 'af': "Multi-hop vraag antwoord (QA) benodig 'n model om inligting te ontvang en integreer van veelvuldige wagte na antwoord 'n vraag. Rapid vordering is gemaak op multi hop QA stelsels met betrekking tot standaard evalueringsmetries, insluitend EM en F1. Maar deur eenvoudig die regverdigheid van die antwoordes te evalueer, is dit onbekende na wat exten hierdie stelsels geleer het die moontlikheid om multi-hop redening te doen. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n addisionele subvraag evaluering vir die multi-hop QA datastel HotpotQA, om 'n paar lig te skei op te verduidelik die redering proses van QA stelsels in antwoord van komplekse vrae. Ons aanvaar 'n neurale dekomposisie model om subvraagte te genereer vir 'n multihopvraag, volg deur die ooreenstemmende subantwoordes te uittrek. In teenwoordigheid met ons verwagting, veelvuldige staat-van-die-kuns multi-hop QA modele het misluk om 'n groot deel van sub-vraag te antwoord, alhoewel die ooreenstemmende multi-hop vraag reg geantwoord word. Ons werk neem 'n stap voort na die bou van 'n meer verduidelik multi hop QA stelsel.", 'az': 'Çoxlu-Hop sual cavab verməsi (QA) bir suala cavab vermək üçün çoxlu keçmişdən məlumatları almaq və birləşdirmək üçün modeli lazımdır. EM və F1 ilə birlikdə standart değerlendirmə metrikləri haqqında çoxlu-Hop QA sistemlərində tələsik tədbir edildi. Ancaq bu sistemlərin çoxlu-Hop dəyişikliklərini nə qədər öyrəndiyi qədər dəyişiklik deyildir. Bu kağızda, çoxlu-hop QA verilən qutusu HotpotQA üçün çoxlu sub-sual değerlendirməyi təklif edirik ki, QA sistemlərinin razılıq prosesini müzakirə suallarına cavab vermək üçün bir az ışıq açmaq üçün QA sistemlərinin razılıq prosesini təsdiqləyirik. Biz çoxlu-Hop suallarını yaratmaq üçün nöral çəkmə modelini qəbul edirik, sonra da müəyyən apa-cavabları çıxardırıq. Bizim gözlədiyimizə qarşı, çoxlu sanat çoxlu-hop QA modellərin çoxlu sub-sualların bir hissəsinin cavabını verməyi başarısız idi. Ancaq müqayisədə olan çoxlu-hop sualların doğru cavabı verildi. Bizim işimiz daha a çıq-aydın bir çox-hop QA sistemini inşa etmək üçün bir adım ileri gəlir.', 'sq': 'Përgjigja e pyetjeve të shumëhapura (QA) kërkon një model për të marrë dhe integruar informacionin nga pasazhe të shumëhapura për të përgjigjur një pyetje. Përparimi i shpejtë është bërë në sistemet QA me shumë hapa lidhur me metrikat standarde të vlerësimit, duke përfshirë EM dhe F1. Megjithatë, duke vlerësuar thjesht saktësinë e përgjigjeve, nuk është e qartë në çfarë mase këto sisteme kanë mësuar aftësinë për të kryer arsyetimin shumëhop ësh. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një vlerësim shtesë nënpyetjeje për kompleksin e të dhënave QA HotpotQA, me qëllim që të hedhim pak dritë mbi shpjegimin e procesit arsyetimi të sistemeve QA në përgjigjen e pyetjeve komplekse. Ne miratojmë një model dekompozimi nervor për të gjeneruar nënpyetje për një pyetje shumë-hopi, pasuar nga nxjerrja e nënpërgjigjeve korrespondente. Në kundërshtim me shpresat tona, modelet e shumëkërcimeve të larta QA nuk përgjigjen në një pjesë të madhe të nënpyetjeve, megjithëse pyetjet e shumëkërcimeve korrespondente janë përgjigjur korrekt. Our work takes a step forward towards building a more explainable multi-hop QA system.', 'bs': 'Odgovor na multihopski pitanje (QA) zahtijeva model za prikupljanje i integraciju informacija iz višestrukih prolaza za odgovor na pitanje. Brzi napredak je postignut u multihopskim QA sistemima u pogledu standardne procjene metrika, uključujući EM i F1. Međutim, jednostavno procjenjivanjem ispravnosti odgovora, nije jasno koliko su ovi sistemi naučili sposobnost izvršavanja multihopskog razuma. U ovom papiru predlažemo dodatnu procjenu podpitanja za multihopsku QA dataset HotpotQA, kako bi se malo osvjetljalo na objašnjenje razumnog procesa QA sistema u odgovoru na složena pitanja. Usvojimo model neuralnog raskidanja kako bi stvorili podpitanja za multihopsko pitanje, nakon što izvlačimo odgovarajuće pododgovore. Pored našeg očekivanja, više modela umjetnosti multi hop a QA ne odgovaraju na veliku deo podpitanja, iako odgovaraju odgovarajuća multihopska pitanja ispravno odgovaraju. Naš rad preduzima korak napred ka izgradnji objašnjivijeg multihopskog QA sistema.', 'hy': 'Multi-hop question answering (QA) requires a model to retrieve and integrate information from multiple passages to answer a question.  Շատ արագ առաջընթաց է կատարվել բազմահոսային QA համակարգերի վերաբերյալ ստանդարտ գնահատման մետրիկների, ներառյալ ԷՄ և F1: Այնուամենայնիվ, պարզապես գնահատելով պատասխանների ճշմարտությունը, անհասկանալի է, թե ինչքանով են այս համակարգերը սովորել բազմաթիվ համոզմունքներ կատարելու ունակությունը: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք ավելին ենթահարցային գնահատականներ բազմահոսական QA տվյալների համակարգի համար, որպեսզի լուսավորենք QA համակարգի մտածողական գործընթացը բարդ հարցերին պատասխանելու համար: Մենք ընդունում ենք նյարդային բաժանման մոդել, որպեսզի ստեղծենք բազմաթիվ հարցերի ենթահարցեր, հետո ստանում ենք համապատասխան ենթապատասխանները: Հակառակ մեր ակնկալումներին, բազմազան բարձրակարգ բազմազան QA մոդելները չեն պատասխանում բազմաթիվ հարցերին, չնայած որ համապատասխան բազմաթիվ հարցերը ճիշտ են պատասխանում: Մեր աշխատանքը քայլ է առաջ է քայլ է անում ավելի բացատրելի բազմահուսային QA համակարգ կառուցելու համար:', 'ca': "La resposta a preguntes multiples necessita un model per recuperar i integrar informació de múltiples passatges per respondre a una pregunta. S'ha aconseguit un ràpid progrés en els sistemes de QA multi-hop en relació a les mètriques d'evaluació estándar, inclosos EM i F1. No obstant això, simplement valorant la correctesa de les respostes, no és clar en quin punt aquests sistemes han après l'habilitat de fer raonament multi-hop. En aquest paper, proposem una evaluació adicional de sub-qüestions per al conjunt de dades QA de múltiples punts HotpotQA, per donar alguna llum a explicar el procés de raonament dels sistemes QA en respondre a preguntes complexes. Adopem un model de descomposició neuronal per generar subqüestions per a una pregunta de múltiples salts, seguida d'extrair les subrespostes correspondents. Contrariament a la nostra expectativa, múltiples models de QA multihops d'última generació no responen a una gran part de les subpreguntes, tot i que les preguntes multihops correspondents són respostes correctament. La nostra feina fa un pas cap a la construcció d'un sistema QA multi-hop més explicable.", 'bn': 'একটি প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রদানের জন্য অনেক পাসেজ থেকে তথ্য পুনরুদ্ধার এবং একত্রিত করার জন্য একটি মডেল প্রয়োজন। মাল্ডার্ডার মূল্যায়ন মেট্রিক সম্পর্কে মাল্টিহোপ কিউএ সিস্টেমে রাপিড অগ্রগতি তৈরি করা হয়েছে, যার মধ্যে ইমেম এবং এফ১ কিন্তু সাধারণত উত্তরের সঠিকভাবে মূল্যায়নের মাধ্যমে এই ব্যবস্থাগুলো কিভাবে মাল্টিহোপের কারণ করার ক্ষমতা শিখেছে তা পরিষ্ক এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বহুহাপ কিউএ ডাটাটাসেট হোটপটিকিয়ার জন্য আরো একটি সাব-প্রশ্নের মূল্যায়ন প্রস্তাব করি, যাতে কিউএ সিস্টেমের কারণের প্রক্রিয়া জটিল প্রশ্ আমরা একটি নিউরেল ডিকমোপসেশন মডেল নির্ধারণ করি একটি বহুল-হোপ প প্রশ্নের জন্য সাব-প্রশ্ন তৈরি করার জন্য, এর পরে সংশ্লিষ্ট সাব-উত্তর বের করে। আমাদের প্রত্যাশার বিরুদ্ধে বিভিন্ন প্রশ্নের বিরুদ্ধে বেশ কিছু প্রশ্নের মডেলের উত্তর প্রদান করতে ব্যর্থ, যদিও সংশ্লিষ্ট মাল্টিহোপ প প্রশ আমাদের কাজ আরো ব্যাখ্যা করা বহুহাপ কিউএ সিস্টেম নির্মাণের প্রতি একটি পদক্ষেপ নেয়।', 'cs': 'Vícehopové odpovědi na otázky (QA) vyžaduje model pro získání a integraci informací z více pasáží k odpovědi na otázku. Rychlý pokrok byl dosažen v oblasti systémů kontroly kvality s více hopy, pokud jde o standardní hodnotící metriky, včetně EM a F1. Nicméně pouhým vyhodnocením správnosti odpovědí není jasné, do jaké míry se tyto systémy naučily provádět multi-hop uvažování. V tomto článku navrhujeme další vyhodnocení dílčích otázek pro multi-hop QA datovou sadu HotpotQA, abychom vysvětlili proces uvažování QA systémů při odpovědi na složité otázky. Přijímáme neuronový dekompoziční model pro generování dílčích otázek pro multi-hop otázku, následně extrahování odpovídajících dílčích odpovědí. Na rozdíl od našich očekávání více nejmodernějších multi-hop QA modelů neodpovídá velkou část dílčích otázek, ačkoli odpovídající multi-hop otázky jsou správně zodpovězeny. Naše práce dělá krok vpřed směrem k vytvoření vysvětlitelnějšího multi-hop QA systému.', 'fi': 'Multi-hop kysymys vastaus (QA) edellyttﾃ､ﾃ､ mallia, jolla voidaan hakea ja integroida tietoja useista kohdista kysymykseen vastaamiseksi. Useiden hyppyjen laadunvarmistusjﾃ､rjestelmissﾃ､ on edistytty nopeasti vakioarviointimetriikassa, mukaan lukien EM ja F1. Kuitenkin yksinkertaisesti arvioimalla vastausten oikeellisuutta on epﾃ､selvﾃ､ﾃ､, missﾃ､ mﾃ､ﾃ､rin nﾃ､mﾃ､ jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､t ovat oppineet tekemﾃ､ﾃ､n multi-hop pﾃ､ﾃ､ttelyﾃ､. Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ tyﾃｶssﾃ､ ehdotamme lisﾃ､kysymysarviointia monisﾃ､ikeiselle laadunvarmistustiedostolle HotpotQA, jotta voitaisiin valottaa laadunvarmistusjﾃ､rjestelmien pﾃ､ﾃ､ttelyprosessia monimutkaisiin kysymyksiin vastaamisessa. Otamme kﾃ､yttﾃｶﾃｶn neurohajoamismallin, joka tuottaa alakysymyksiﾃ､ monihyppykysymykselle ja jonka jﾃ､lkeen poimimme vastaavat alakysymykset. Toisin kuin odotimme, useat huipputekniset multi-hop laadunvarmistusmallit eivﾃ､t vastaa suurelle osalle alakysymyksistﾃ､, vaikka vastaavat multi-hop kysymykset on vastattu oikein. Tyﾃｶssﾃ､mme otetaan askel eteenpﾃ､in kohti selitettﾃ､vﾃ､mpﾃ､ﾃ､ multi-hop laadunvarmistusjﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ﾃ､.', 'et': 'Mitme hüppega küsimustele vastamine (QA) nõuab mudelit, et saada ja integreerida teavet mitmest lõigust, et vastata küsimusele. Mitme hüppega kvaliteedi tagamise süsteemide puhul on tehtud kiireid edusamme standardsete hindamismeetrite, sealhulgas EM ja F1 osas. Kuid lihtsalt hinnates vastuste õigsust, on ebaselge, mil määral need süsteemid on õppinud võimet teostada multi-hop arutlust. Käesolevas töös pakume välja täiendava alamküsimuse hindamise mitme-hop QA andmekogumi HotpotQA jaoks, et selgitada kvaliteedi tagamise süsteemide arutlusprotsessi keerukatele küsimustele vastamisel. Võtame kasutusele neuraalse lagunemise mudeli, et genereerida alamküsimused multihüppe küsimusele, millele järgneb vastavate alamvastuste väljavõtmine. Vastupidiselt meie ootustele ei vasta mitmed kaasaegsed multi-hop kvaliteedi tagamise mudelid suurele osale alamküsimustest, kuigi vastavatele multi-hop küsimustele vastatakse õigesti. Meie töö astub sammu edasi selgitatavama multi-hop kvaliteedi tagamise süsteemi loomise suunas.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), "politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Pirem sing wis kelas barang nggawe barang-barêng, KEA sistem sing nggawe barang manut karo pakem pancening, gambar EM lan F1. Nanging, nganggep kuwi cah-cah pisan kanggo bagian apat, kuwi ora kesempatan kanggo sampeyan sistem iki dianggap kanggo sampek banter-banter seneng pisan. Nang paper iki, kéné supoyo perusahaan langgar-suarané supra-suarané kanggo ngerasakno multi-hol qA dataset Hotpot Awak dhéwé nggunaké model penting nggawe kno-kno kanggo nyenggawe apa-sualan kanggo multi-kno kesempatan, seneng nggawe ngupakan apa-sualan Tulung wigatahan karo awakdhéwé, akeh langgar stad-karo-karo multi-oper Awakdhéwé nglanggar sampek mulai kanggo nggawe sistem sing bisa akeh-sampek yang luwih apik.', 'he': 'Multi-hop question answering (QA) requires a model to retrieve and integrate information from multiple passages to answer a question.  התקדמות מהירה נעשתה על מערכות QA multi-hop בנוגע למטריות הערכה סטנדרטית, כולל EM ו F1. עם זאת, על ידי בדיוק הערכה של התשובות נכון, לא ברור עד כמה המערכות הללו למדו את היכולת לבצע הגיון multi-hop. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים עריכה נוספת של תחת שאלות עבור קבוצת נתונים ממולטי-הופ QA HotpotQA, כדי לשפוך קצת אור על ההסבר תהליך ההיגיון של מערכות QA בתשובה לשאלות מורכבות. אנו מאמצים מודל פיצוץ עצבי כדי ליצור תחת-שאלות לשאלה ממולטי-הופ, ואחריו חולץ את התת-תשובות המתאימות. בניגוד לציפייתנו, דוגמני QA המולטר-הופ מצפונים במיוחד לא עונים על חלק גדול של sub-שאלות, למרות שהשאלות המולטר-הופ מתאימות נענות נכון. העבודה שלנו לוקחת צעד קדימה לכיוון בניית מערכת QA multi-hop מוסברת יותר.', 'ha': "QA yana buƙata wani motsi dõmin ya motsa kuma ya haɗi maɓalli daga zafiyan hanya masu yawa dõmin ya karɓa wa tambaya. An sami pid-gabatarwa a kan wasu-jump QA-system masu husu da metric evaluation na daidaita, tare da EM da F1. A lokacin da aka hakaɓa masu inganci, bai zama na sani ba ga yadda aka sanar da abincin waɗannan na'urar da za'a yi aiki na fassarar-multi-jumi. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata ƙara wa masu ƙaranci wa QA-data HotPotQA, don ya iya nuna wani haske a kan rarraba fassarar-ingancin na QA cikin su karɓa wa tambayar masu husũma. Tuna sami wani misali na'ura dõmin ya ƙãga masu sakan masu ƙaranci wa masu tambayar multi-jump, da kuma za'a sami masu daidai da jayayar sub-jibi. Fãce da tsakanin tsammãni, misãlai masu yawa na-halin-kunnuwa-multi-jum QA sun kasa karya jibar da rabin rabon masu ƙarƙasan maswali, kuma ingawa da masu daidai na tambayar multi-jum na daidaita. Kaimarmu ya tafi gaba ɗaya zuwa ga kuɓutar da wata na'urar QA mai fassarawa da yawa.", 'sk': 'Odgovor na vprašanja z več koraki (QA) zahteva model za pridobivanje in integriranje informacij iz več odlomkov za odgovor na vprašanje. Hiter napredek je bil dosežen na področju sistemov za zagotavljanje kakovosti v več korakih glede standardnih meritev vrednotenja, vključno z EM in F1. Vendar pa s preprosto oceno pravilnosti odgovorov ni jasno, v kolikšni meri so se ti sistemi naučili sposobnosti izvajanja multi-hop razmišljanja. V prispevku predlagamo dodatno podvprašanje vrednotenja podatkovnega nabora podatkov o odgovoru na kompleksna vprašanja HotpotQA z namenom pojasnitve procesa obrazložitve sistemov o odgovoru na kompleksna vprašanja. Sprejmemo model nevronske razgradnje, da ustvarimo podvprašanja za multi-hop vprašanje, ki mu sledi ekstrakcija ustreznih pododgovorov. V nasprotju z našimi pričakovanji več najsodobnejših multi-hop modelov kakovosti ne odgovarja na velik del podvprašanj, čeprav so ustrezna multi-hop vprašanja pravilno odgovorjena. Naše delo naredi korak naprej v smeri izgradnje bolj pojasnljivega multi-hop sistema kakovosti.', 'bo': 'Multi-hop འདྲི་ཞིབ་ལ་ལན་གསལ་བ(QA)དགོས Rapid progress has been made on multi-hop QA systems with regard to standard evaluation metrics, including EM and F1. ཡིན་ནའང་། རྟག་པར་ལན་གསལ་ལྡན་གྱི་བདེ་འཇགས་རིས་དཔྱད་བྱས་ན། མ་ལག་འདི་དག་གི་གནས་སྟངས་གང་ཞིག་ལབ་རྒྱུ་དང་ཤེས་ཀྱི་ཡོད། In this paper, we propose an additional sub-question evaluation for the multi-hop QA dataset HotpotQA, in order to shed some light on explaining the reasoning process of QA systems in answering complex questions. ང་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་མཁན་དབུགས་སྟོན་པའི་མ་གཟུགས་རིས་འདྲི་བ་ཞིག་གསར་བསྐྲུན་འབད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་རེ་འདུག་ལ་དང་མཐུན་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་སྣ་མང་པོ་སྣང་གྲངས་ཀ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་ལ་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ལ་སྔོན་སྐྱོད་དུ་གཏོང་མཁན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་མང་ཙམ་འགྱུར་ཐབས་ཤིག་ཏུ་གཏ'}
{'en': 'Variational Weakly Supervised Sentiment Analysis with Posterior Regularization', 'pt': 'Análise Variacional de Sentimento Fracamente Supervisionada com Regularização Posterior', 'ar': 'تحليل المشاعر المتغير الخاضع للإشراف الضعيف مع التنظيم اللاحق', 'fr': 'Analyse variationnelle faiblement supervisée du sentiment avec régularisation postérieure', 'es': 'Análisis de sentimiento variacional débilmente supervisado con regularización posterior', 'ja': '後方規則化を伴う弱く監督された変動感情分析', 'hi': 'पश्चवर्ती नियमितीकरण के साथ परिवर्तनीय कमजोर रूप से पर्यवेक्षित भावना विश्लेषण', 'zh': '有后验正则化变分弱监情析', 'ru': 'Вариационный слабо контролируемый анализ настроений с последующей регуляризацией', 'ga': 'Anailís Mothúchán Éagsúla faoi Mhaoirseacht Lag le Rialáil Iarmharta', 'el': 'Μεταβλητική Αδυναμία Εποπτευμένη Ανάλυση Συναισθημάτων με Μεταγενέστερη Ρυθμοποίηση', 'hu': 'Variációs gyengén felügyelt érzelmi elemzés poszterior regularizációval', 'ka': 'განსხვავებული Weakly Supervised Sentiment Analysis with Posterior Regularization', 'it': 'Analisi dei sentimenti debolmente supervisionata con regolarizzazione posteriore', 'kk': 'Айнымалы күнделікті бақылау күнделікті синтиментті Posterior регулярлауымен анализ', 'mk': 'Анализа на различни слабо надгледувани чувства со позадина регуларизација', 'lt': 'Variacinė silpnai prižiūrima jutimo analizė su užpakaliniu reguliavimu', 'ms': 'Analisis Sentimen Bervariasi Terwaspada dengan Pengaturan Belakang', 'mt': 'Variational Weakly Supervised Sentiment Analysis with Posterior Regularization', 'ml': 'Variational Weakly Supervised Sentiment Analysis with Posterior Regularization', 'mn': 'Төвөрмөц өдөр тутмын ажилласан мэдрэмжтэй шинжилгээ', 'no': 'Varisjonell vektlig oversikt sentralanalyse med Posterioregularisering', 'si': 'පොස්ටරියර් සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණය සමග වෙනස් විශේෂය අවස්ථාවක් පරීක්ෂණය', 'pl': 'Wariancyjna słabo nadzorowana analiza sentymentów z regularyzacją posteriorów', 'sr': 'Varijacionalna slaba nadzorna analiza sentimentalnog analiza sa posteriorskom regularizacijom', 'sv': 'Variationssvagt övervakad känsloanalys med posterior regularisering', 'ro': 'Analiza sentimentelor slab supravegheate cu regularizare posterioară', 'ta': 'மாறி வாரத்தில் பரிசோதிக்கப்பட்ட உணர்வு விளக்கம்', 'ur': 'پوسٹر ریجرالیز کے ساتھ متغیر نازل ہونے والی سنٹیمنٹ تحلیل', 'so': 'Variable Week Supervised Sentiment Analysis with Posterior Regularization', 'vi': 'Xem tình cảm thay đổi theo sau', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'da': 'Variation svagt overvåget følelsesanalyse med posterior regularisering', 'nl': 'Variatieve zwak begeleide sentimentanalyse met posterioire regularisatie', 'bg': 'Вариационен слабо контролиран анализ на сентимента с последваща регуляризация', 'id': 'Analisis Sentimen Variasi yang Tersupervisi Dengan Regularisasi Posterior', 'hr': 'Varijacionalna nedavno nadzirana analiza osjećaja s regularizacijom posteriora', 'fa': 'تحلیل احساسات تغییرات ضعیف تحقیق شده با تغییرات قانونی', 'de': 'Variationsschwach überwachte Stimmungsanalyse mit posteriorer Regularisierung', 'ko': '후험 정규화의 변분약 감독 정서 분석을 가지고 있다', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa Seneti uliofanywa na Utawala wa Utawala', 'tr': 'Aýratyn Aýry Gözlemýän Sened Taýramy Posterior Namaýlaşdyrma bilen', 'sq': 'Analizë e ndjenjave të varfëra të mbikqyrura dobësisht me rregullimin e posteriorit', 'af': 'Veranderlike Weekly Oversigde Sentiment Analysis met Posterior Regularisasie', 'az': 'Posterior Regularizasyonu ilə dəyişiklik Ağır Gözlənmiş Sentiment Analizi', 'bn': 'পোস্টারিয়ার নিয়মিতকরণের সাথে বিভিন্ন সপ্তাহে সেন্টাইমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণ', 'bs': 'Varijacionalna slaba nadzorna analiza osjećajnog razdoblja sa regularizacijom posteriora', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'ca': 'Anàlisi Variacional de Sentiments Fablement Supervisionats amb Regularizació Posterior', 'hy': 'Առաջին ռեգուլարիզացիայի միջոցով տարբերակային թույլ վերահսկված զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը', 'et': 'Variatsiooniline nõrgalt kontrollitud tunnete analüüs koos posterior regulariseerimisega', 'fi': 'Heikkosti valvottu tunneanalyysi jälkimmäisen säätelyn avulla', 'cs': 'Variační slabě dohlížená analýza sentimentů s posteriorní regularizací', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'sk': 'Variacijska šibko nadzorovana analiza čustev s posteriorno regularizacijo', 'he': 'ניתוח רגשות משתנה בשליטה חלשה עם ריגוריזציה מאחורית', 'bo': 'རྣམ་པ་འགྱུར་ཅན་ལ་བསྡུས་པའི་ལྟ་སྟངས་ཚོད་དུས་ཚོད་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Sentiment analysis is an important task in natural language processing (NLP). Most of existing state-of-the-art methods are under the supervised learning paradigm. However, human annotations can be scarce. Thus, we should leverage more weak supervision for sentiment analysis. In this paper, we propose a posterior regularization framework for the variational approach to the weakly supervised sentiment analysis to better control the posterior distribution of the label assignment. The intuition behind the posterior regularization is that if extracted opinion words from two documents are semantically similar, the posterior distributions of two documents should be similar. Our experimental results show that the posterior regularization can improve the original variational approach to the weakly supervised sentiment analysis and the performance is more stable with smaller prediction variance.', 'ar': 'يعد تحليل المشاعر مهمة مهمة في معالجة اللغة الطبيعية (NLP). تخضع معظم الأساليب الحديثة الحالية لنموذج التعلم الخاضع للإشراف. ومع ذلك ، قد تكون التعليقات التوضيحية البشرية نادرة. وبالتالي ، يجب علينا الاستفادة من المزيد من الإشراف الضعيف لتحليل المعنويات. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح إطارًا تنظيميًا لاحقًا للنهج المتغير لتحليل المشاعر الخاضع للإشراف الضعيف للتحكم بشكل أفضل في التوزيع اللاحق لمهمة التسمية. الحدس وراء التنظيم اللاحق هو أنه إذا كانت كلمات الرأي المستخرجة من وثيقتين متشابهة لغويًا ، فيجب أن تكون التوزيعات اللاحقة لوثيقتين متشابهة. تظهر نتائجنا التجريبية أن التنظيم اللاحق يمكن أن يحسن النهج المتغير الأصلي لتحليل المشاعر الخاضع للإشراف الضعيف وأن الأداء أكثر استقرارًا مع تباين تنبؤ أصغر.', 'pt': 'A análise de sentimentos é uma tarefa importante no processamento de linguagem natural (PLN). A maioria dos métodos de última geração existentes está sob o paradigma de aprendizado supervisionado. No entanto, as anotações humanas podem ser escassas. Assim, devemos alavancar uma supervisão mais fraca para análise de sentimento. Neste artigo, propomos uma estrutura de regularização posterior para a abordagem variacional da análise de sentimento fracamente supervisionada para controlar melhor a distribuição posterior da atribuição de rótulos. A intuição por trás da regularização posterior é que se palavras de opinião extraídas de dois documentos são semanticamente semelhantes, as distribuições posteriores de dois documentos devem ser semelhantes. Nossos resultados experimentais mostram que a regularização posterior pode melhorar a abordagem variacional original para a análise de sentimento fracamente supervisionada e o desempenho é mais estável com menor variância de previsão.', 'es': 'El análisis de sentimientos es una tarea importante en el procesamiento del lenguaje natural (NLP). La mayoría de los métodos de vanguardia existentes están bajo el paradigma del aprendizaje supervisado. Sin embargo, las anotaciones humanas pueden ser escasas. Por lo tanto, deberíamos aprovechar una supervisión más débil para el análisis de sentimientos. En este artículo, proponemos un marco de regularización posterior para el enfoque variacional del análisis de sentimiento débilmente supervisado para controlar mejor la distribución posterior de la asignación de etiquetas. La intuición detrás de la regularización posterior es que si las palabras de opinión extraídas de dos documentos son semánticamente similares, las distribuciones posteriores de dos documentos deberían ser similares. Nuestros resultados experimentales muestran que la regularización posterior puede mejorar el enfoque variacional original para el análisis de sentimiento débilmente supervisado y el rendimiento es más estable con una varianza de predicción más pequeña.', 'fr': "L'analyse des sentiments est une tâche importante dans le traitement du langage naturel (TALN). La plupart des méthodes de pointe existantes relèvent du paradigme de l'apprentissage supervisé. Cependant, les annotations humaines peuvent être rares. Nous devrions donc tirer parti d'une supervision plus faible pour l'analyse des sentiments. Dans cet article, nous proposons un cadre de régularisation postérieure pour l'approche variationnelle de l'analyse des sentiments faiblement supervisée afin de mieux contrôler la distribution postérieure de l'attribution des étiquettes. L'intuition derrière la régularisation postérieure est que si les mots d'opinion extraits de deux documents sont sémantiquement similaires, les distributions postérieures de deux documents devraient être similaires. Nos résultats expérimentaux montrent que la régularisation postérieure peut améliorer l'approche variationnelle originale de l'analyse des sentiments faiblement supervisée et que la performance est plus stable avec une variance de prédiction plus faible.", 'ja': '感情分析は、自然言語処理（ NLP ）における重要な課題である。既存の最先端の方法のほとんどは、監督下の学習パラダイムの下にある。しかし、人間の注釈は乏しい場合がある。したがって、感情分析のためにもっと弱い監督を活用すべきです。本論文では、弱監督型センチメント分析へのバリエーションアプローチのための後方正規化フレームワークを提案し、ラベル割り当ての後方分布をより良く制御する。後方正規化の背後にある直感は、2つの文書から抽出された意見語が意味的に類似している場合、2つの文書の後方分布が類似しているはずであるということである。我々の実験結果は、後方正規化が弱く監視された感情分析に対する元の変動アプローチを改善し、予測分散が小さいほどパフォーマンスがより安定することを示しています。', 'zh': '情析者,自然语言处 (NLP) 之要务也。 大抵见先进之法,皆在监习范式下。 然人工注释或少。 因此,我们应该用更弱的监管来分析。 本文发弱督情析变分法后向正则化框架,以愈制标分后验分布。 后验正则化背之直觉,若取两文档意见词相似于语义,则两文档之后验布宜相似。 实验结果表明,后验正则化可改弱督情之变分,而性更定,占方差更小。', 'hi': 'भावना विश्लेषण प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण (एनएलपी) में एक महत्वपूर्ण कार्य है। मौजूदा अत्याधुनिक तरीकों में से अधिकांश पर्यवेक्षित सीखने के प्रतिमान के तहत हैं। हालांकि, मानव एनोटेशन दुर्लभ हो सकते हैं। इस प्रकार, हमें भावना विश्लेषण के लिए अधिक कमजोर पर्यवेक्षण का लाभ उठाना चाहिए। इस पेपर में, हम लेबल असाइनमेंट के पीछे के वितरण को बेहतर ढंग से नियंत्रित करने के लिए कमजोर रूप से पर्यवेक्षित भावना विश्लेषण के लिए भिन्नतात्मक दृष्टिकोण के लिए एक पश्चवर्ती नियमितीकरण ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। पीछे के नियमितीकरण के पीछे अंतर्ज्ञान यह है कि यदि दो दस्तावेजों से निकाले गए राय शब्द शब्दार्थ रूप से समान हैं, तो दो दस्तावेजों के पीछे के वितरण समान होने चाहिए। हमारे प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि पीछे के नियमितीकरण कमजोर रूप से पर्यवेक्षित भावना विश्लेषण के लिए मूल परिवर्तनीय दृष्टिकोण में सुधार कर सकते हैं और प्रदर्शन छोटे पूर्वानुमान विचरण के साथ अधिक स्थिर है।', 'ru': 'Анализ настроений является важной задачей в обработке естественного языка (NLP). Большинство существующих современных методов основаны на парадигме контролируемого обучения. Однако человеческие аннотации могут быть скудными. Таким образом, мы должны использовать более слабый надзор для анализа настроений. В этой статье мы предлагаем структуру задней регуляризации для вариационного подхода к слабо контролируемому анализу настроений для лучшего контроля заднего распределения назначения метки. Интуиция апостериорной регуляризации заключается в том, что если извлеченные слова мнения из двух документов семантически схожи, то апостериорные распределения двух документов должны быть схожими. Наши экспериментальные результаты показывают, что задняя регуляризация может улучшить исходный вариационный подход к слабо контролируемому анализу настроений, и производительность более стабильна с меньшей дисперсией прогноза.', 'ga': 'Is tasc tábhachtach i bpróiseáil teanga nádúrtha (NLP) í anailís mothúcháin. Tá an chuid is mó de na modhanna úrscothacha atá ann faoi láthair faoin bparadigm foghlama maoirsithe. Is féidir le nótaí daonna a bheith gann, áfach. Mar sin, ba cheart dúinn maoirsiú níos laige a ghiaráil le haghaidh anailíse meon. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid creat rialtaithe ina dhiaidh sin don chur chuige athraitheach i leith na hanailíse meoin faoi mhaoirsiú lag chun rialú níos fearr a dhéanamh ar dháileadh an taisc lipéid níos déanaí. Is é an t-intleacht atá taobh thiar den rialtacht níos déanaí ná má tá focail thuairime a bhaintear as dhá dhoiciméad comhchosúil go seimeantach, ba cheart go mbeadh an dá dhoiciméad ar an dá dhoiciméad ar a chéile mar a chéile. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí turgnamhacha gur féidir leis an rialtacht posterior feabhas a chur ar an gcur chuige athraitheach bunaidh maidir leis an anailís aireachtála faoi mhaoirseacht lag agus go bhfuil an fheidhmíocht níos cobhsaí le héagsúlacht réamh-mheastacháin níos lú.', 'el': 'Η ανάλυση συναισθημάτων είναι ένα σημαντικό έργο στην επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας. Οι περισσότερες από τις υπάρχουσες μεθόδους τελευταίας τεχνολογίας βρίσκονται κάτω από το εποπτευόμενο παράδειγμα μάθησης. Ωστόσο, οι ανθρώπινες σημειώσεις μπορεί να είναι σπάνιες. Έτσι, θα πρέπει να αξιοποιήσουμε περισσότερο αδύναμη εποπτεία για την ανάλυση συναισθημάτων. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα πλαίσιο μεταγενέστερης regularisation για την παραλλαγή της ασθενώς εποπτευόμενης ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων για τον καλύτερο έλεγχο της οπίσθιας κατανομής της αντιστοίχισης ετικετών. Η διαίσθηση πίσω από την οπίσθια ρύθμιση είναι ότι αν οι λέξεις γνώμης που εξάγονται από δύο έγγραφα είναι σημασιολογικά παρόμοιες, οι οπίσθιες διανομές δύο εγγράφων θα πρέπει να είναι παρόμοιες. Τα πειραματικά μας αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η οπίσθια ρύθμιση μπορεί να βελτιώσει την αρχική προσέγγιση παραλλαγής στην αδύναμα εποπτευόμενη ανάλυση συναισθημάτων και η απόδοση είναι πιο σταθερή με μικρότερη διακύμανση πρόβλεψης.', 'ka': 'Sentiment ანალიზია გასანიშვნელოვანი სახელის პროცესი (NLP). უფრო მეტი წარმოდგენებული სწავლების პარადიგმა ქვემოთ. მაგრამ ადამიანის ამოცანები შეიძლება იყოს ცოტა. ამიტომ, ჩვენ უნდა უფრო ძალიან სტრუმენტის ანალიზაციისთვის გავაკეთოთ. ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ დავიწყებთ პოსტერიოს რეგრალიზაციის ფრამეტრის გარიანციალური პროგრამისთვის, რომელიც უფრო ნარჩეულებული სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციას, რომ უფრო კონტროლურად ინტეუცია შემდეგ რეგილარიზაციაში არის, რომ თუ ორი დოკუმენტებიდან ექსტრექტირებული მნიშვნელობის სიტყვები სენმანტიკურად მსგავსია, ორი დოკუმენტების შემდეგ გაყოფილი უ ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები აჩვენებს, რომ პოსტერიური რეგრალიზაცია შეუძლია უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა გარი', 'hu': 'Az érzelmek elemzése fontos feladat a természetes nyelv feldolgozásában (NLP). A legtöbb meglévő korszerű módszer a felügyelt tanulási paradigma alá tartozik. Azonban az emberi megjegyzések ritkák lehetnek. Ezért gyengébb felügyeletet kell használnunk az érzelmek elemzéséhez. Jelen tanulmányban egy posterior regularizációs keretrendszert javasolunk a gyengén felügyelt sentiment analízis variációs megközelítéséhez, hogy jobban ellenőrizzük a címke hozzárendelés posterior eloszlását. A hátsó szabályozás mögötti intuíció az, hogy ha két dokumentumból kivont véleményszavak szemantikailag hasonlóak, akkor két dokumentum hátsó eloszlásának hasonlónak kell lennie. Kísérleti eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy a posterior regularizáció javíthatja a gyengén felügyelt érzelmek eredeti variációs megközelítését, és a teljesítmény stabilabb kisebb predikciós variancia mellett.', 'kk': 'Жіберуші анализ - табиғи тілдерді өңдеу (NLP) үшін маңызды тапсырма. Көпшілігі оқыту парадигмінің көпшілігі. Бірақ адамдардың түсініктемелері қиын болуы мүмкін. Бұл үшін сезімдік анализ үшін көп бақытты қарау керек. Бұл қағазда, жарлық тапсырманың кейінгі үлестірімін жақсы басқару үшін әртүрлі қасиеттерді бақылау үшін кейінгі үлестіру бағдарламасын ұсындық. Екі құжаттан кейінгі қадамдастыру артындағы интузиясы - егер екі құжаттан кейінгі мәлімет сөздері семантикалық ұқсас болса, екі құжаттың кейінгі тарату ұқсас болу керек. Тәжірибелік нәтижелеріміз кейінгі тәжірибелігінің бастапқы түрлі тәжірибелігін бақылау үшін өзгертілген сезімдер анализациясына жақсартуға болады, және оқиғалар кі', 'ms': 'Analisis perasaan adalah tugas penting dalam proses bahasa semulajadi (NLP). Kebanyakan kaedah yang ada di bawah paradigma pembelajaran yang diawasi. Namun, anotasi manusia boleh menjadi jarang. Oleh itu, kita harus menggunakan pengawasan yang lebih lemah untuk analisis perasaan. Dalam kertas ini, kami melamar kerangka pengaturan belakang untuk pendekatan variasi kepada analisis perasaan yang terkawal lemah untuk mengawal lebih baik distribusi belakang tugas label. Intuisi di belakang regularisasi belakang ialah jika perkataan pendapat ekstrak dari dua dokumen secara semantik sama, distribusi belakang dua dokumen sepatutnya sama. Our experimental results show that the posterior regularization can improve the original variational approach to the weakly supervised sentiment analysis and the performance is more stable with smaller prediction variance.', 'it': "L'analisi dei sentimenti è un compito importante nell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale (PNL). La maggior parte dei metodi esistenti all'avanguardia sono sotto il paradigma di apprendimento supervisionato. Tuttavia, le annotazioni umane possono essere scarse. Pertanto, dovremmo sfruttare una vigilanza più debole per l'analisi del sentiment. In questo articolo, proponiamo un framework di regolarizzazione posteriore per l'approccio variazionale all'analisi del sentiment debolmente supervisionata per controllare meglio la distribuzione posteriore dell'assegnazione dell'etichetta. L'intuizione dietro la regolarizzazione posteriore è che se le parole di opinione estratte da due documenti sono semanticamente simili, le distribuzioni posteriori di due documenti dovrebbero essere simili. I nostri risultati sperimentali mostrano che la regolarizzazione posteriore può migliorare l'approccio variazionale originale all'analisi del sentiment debolmente supervisionata e la performance è più stabile con varianza predittiva minore.", 'lt': 'Sentimento analizė yra svarbi gamtinių kalbų apdorojimo užduotis. Dauguma esamų moderniausių metodų atitinka prižiūrimą mokymosi paradigm ą. However, human annotations can be scarce.  Thus, we should leverage more weak supervision for sentiment analysis.  Šiame dokumente siūlome galinio reguliavimo sistemą, pagal kurią būtų galima taikyti skirtingą požiūrį į silpnai prižiūrimą jausmų analizę, kad būtų geriau kontroliuojamas galinis etiketės paskirstymas. Galinio reguliarizavimo intuicija yra ta, kad jei ištraukti nuomonės žodžiai iš dviejų dokumentų yra semantiškai panašūs, galinis dviejų dokumentų platinimas turėtų būti panašus. Mūsų eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad galinė reguliarizacija gali pagerinti pradinį požiūrį į silpnai prižiūrimą jausmų analizę, o rezultatai yra stabilesni ir mažesnis prognozės skirtumas.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജോലിയാണു് (NLP). നിലവിലുള്ള രീതിയില്\u200d മിക്കവാറും കലാകാര്യങ്ങളുടെ രീതികള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കപ്പെടുന്നതിന് കീഴിലാണ്. എന്നാലും, മനുഷ്യരുടെ അഭിപ്രായശ്ചിത്രങ്ങള്\u200d കുറച്ച് പേരായിരിക്കും. അതുകൊണ്ട്, നമുക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d ദുര്\u200dബലമായ നിരീക്ഷണത്തിന് വിശദീകരിക്കേണ്ടതുണ്ട്. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പോസ്റ്റേറിയര്\u200d നിയന്ത്രണത്തിന്റെ ഫ്രെയിമെന്\u200dറ് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. ലേബ്ലേറ്റിന്\u200dറെ വിതരണ വിതരണം കൂടുതല്\u200d നല പോസ്റ്റര്\u200d നിയന്ത്രണത്തിന്റെ പിന്നിലുള്ള ഉള്\u200dക്കൊള്ളുന്ന കാര്യം എന്താണെന്നാല്\u200d രണ്ടു രേഖകളില്\u200d നിന്നും അഭിപ്രായം വാക്ക നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു പോസ്റ്റര്\u200d നിയന്ത്രണത്തിന്റെ ആദ്യത്തെ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d കഴിയ', 'mk': 'Анализата на чувствата е важна задача во природното обработување на јазикот (NLP). Повеќето постоечки најдобри методи се под надгледуваниот парадигм на учење. Сепак, човечките анотации можат да бидат ретки. Затоа, ние треба да искористиме послаб надзор за анализа на чувствата. Во овој весник, предложуваме задна регуларизациска рамка за варијационалниот пристап до слабо надгледуваната анализа на чувствата за подобра контрола на задната дистрибуција на задачата на задачата на етикетата. Интуицијата зад задната регуларизација е дека ако извадените зборови на мислењето од двата документи се семантично слични, задните дистрибуции на двата документи треба да бидат слични. Нашите експериментални резултати покажуваат дека задната регуларизација може да го подобри оригиналниот варијационален пристап до слабо надгледуваната анализа на чувствата и резултатот е постабилен со помала варијанција на предвидување.', 'mn': 'Sentiment шинжилгээ нь байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэхэд чухал ажил юм. Ихэнх орчин үеийн урлагийн аргыг удирдлагатай суралцах парадигм доор байдаг. Гэхдээ хүн төрөлхтний сэтгэл хөдлөл хэцүү байж болно. Тэгэхээр бид сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээнд илүү сул байдлаар нөлөөлөх хэрэгтэй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэвлэлийн дараагийн хуваарилалтыг сайн удирдах зорилготой мэдрэмжтэй шинжилгээнд өөрчлөлтийн арга хэмжээний дахин дахин дахин дахин дүрслэх хэлбэрийг санал болгож байна. Дараагийн дүгнэлтийн дараагийн ойлголт нь хэрвээ хоёр баримтуудаас гаргасан ойлголт үгсийг хэдэн дахин төстэй байвал хоёр баримтуудын дараагийн хуваарилалт нь төстэй байх ёстой. Бидний туршилтын үр дүнд дараагийн дүрслэл нь үндсэн мэдрэмжтэй шинжилгээнд үндсэн өөрчлөлтийг сайжруулж чадна.', 'no': 'Sentimentanalyse er ein viktig oppgåve i naturspråkopling (NLP). Dei fleste eksisterande metodane for kunsten er under den oversikte læringsparadigmen. Men menneske notasjonar kan vera kraftig. Derfor bør vi levera meir svakt oversikt for sentimentanalyser. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit etter reguleringsrammeverk for den variasjonale tilnærminga til den viktig oversikte sentimentanalisen for å betre kontrollera den etter fordelinga av merkelappen. Innstillinga bak reguliseringa etter etterpå er at dersom det er utpakka opplysningsord frå to dokument er semantisk liknande, bør dei etterpå distribusjonane av to dokument vera liknande. Eksperimentale resultatet våre viser at den etterre regularisasjonen kan forbedra den opprinnelige variasjonale tilnærminga til den viktig oversikte sentimentanalisen og utviklinga er meir stabil med mindre forhåndsvisningsvariansen.', 'mt': 'L-analiżi tas-sensazzjoni hija kompitu importanti fl-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali (NLP). Il-biċċa l-kbira tal-metodi l-aktar avvanzati eżistenti huma taħt il-paradigma ta’ tagħlim sorveljat. Madankollu, l- annotazzjonijiet umani jistgħu jkunu skarsi. Għalhekk, għandna nħeġġu superviżjoni aktar dgħajfa għall-analiżi tas-sentimenti. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu qafas ta’ regolarizzazzjoni posterjuri għall-approċċ varjazzjonali għall-analiżi tas-sensazzjoni b’superviżjoni dgħajfa biex tiġi kkontrollata a ħjar id-distribuzzjoni posterjuri tal-assenjazzjoni tat-tikketta. L-intwizzjoni wara r-regolarizzazzjoni posterjuri hija li jekk il-kliem tal-opinjoni estratta minn żewġ dokumenti jkunu semantikament simili, id-distribuzzjonijiet posterjuri ta’ żewġ dokumenti għandhom ikunu simili. Ir-riżultati sperimentali tagħna juru li r-regolarizzazzjoni posterjuri tista’ ttejjeb l-approċċ varjazzjonali oriġinali għall-analiżi tas-sentimenti b’superviżjoni dgħajfa u l-prestazzjoni hija aktar stabbli b’varjanza ta’ tbassir iżgħar.', 'pl': 'Analiza sentymentów jest ważnym zadaniem w przetwarzaniu języka naturalnego (NLP). Większość istniejących najnowocześniejszych metod jest objęta paradygmatem uczenia się nadzorowanego. Jednak ludzkie adnotacje mogą być rzadkie. W związku z tym powinniśmy wykorzystać bardziej słaby nadzór do analizy sentymentów. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy ramy regulacji tylnej dla wariancyjnego podejścia do słabo nadzorowanej analizy sentymentów w celu lepszej kontroli tylnego rozkładu przypisywania etykiety. Intuicja stojąca za tylną regularyzacją jest taka, że jeśli wyodrębnione słowa opinii z dwóch dokumentów są semantycznie podobne, tylne rozkłady dwóch dokumentów powinny być podobne. Nasze wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że regulacja tylna może poprawić oryginalne podejście wariancyjne do słabo nadzorowanej analizy sentymentów, a wydajność jest bardziej stabilna przy mniejszej wariancji przewidywania.', 'so': 'Shahaadada xilliga ah waxaa lagu sameynayaa shaqo muhiim ah oo ku baaraandegista luqada asalka ah (NLP). Midabka farshaxanka ah ee uu heysto inta badan waxay ka hoos yihiin mid la ilaaliyo waxbarashada. However, human annotations can be scarce.  Sidaas darteed, waxaynu waajib u nahay in aynu u sameyno ilaaliyo itaal daruur badan si aan u sameyno baaritaanka fikrada. Qoraalkan waxan ku qoran, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qoraal regulariisi oo ah qaababka kala duwan ee lagu sameeyo baaritaanka maandooriyaha oo tabarta yar oo la ilaaliyo si aad ugu hagaagsan u maamulid qaybinta dabaraadka. Fiiridda ka dambeeya nidaamka kadib waa in haddii hadalka aragtida laga soo saaray laba dukumenti ay isku mid yihiin, qaybinta labada dukumenti ee ka dambeeya waa in la mid ahaadaa. Fashihiisa jirrabka ah waxay muuqataa in la beddeliyo qaababka asalka ah oo la beddelin karo baaritaanka fikrada ee tabarta yar ee la ilaaliyo, tababarkiina waa mid ka sii qallafsan yahay, waxayna leedahay bedelka wax yar oo la sii sheego.', 'ro': 'Analiza sentimentelor este o sarcină importantă în procesarea limbajului natural (PNL). Majoritatea metodelor de ultimă generație existente se află sub paradigma de învățare supravegheată. Cu toate acestea, adnotările umane pot fi rare. Astfel, ar trebui să folosim o supraveghere mai slabă pentru analiza sentimentelor. În această lucrare, propunem un cadru de regularizare posterioară pentru abordarea variaţională a analizei sentimentelor slab supravegheate pentru a controla mai bine distribuţia posterioară a atribuirii etichetei. Intuiția din spatele regularizării posterioare este că dacă cuvintele de opinie extrase din două documente sunt semantic similare, distribuțiile posterioare ale două documente ar trebui să fie similare. Rezultatele experimentale arată că regularizarea posterioară poate îmbunătăți abordarea variațională inițială a analizei sentimentelor slab supravegheate, iar performanța este mai stabilă cu variație de predicție mai mică.', 'si': 'Sentiment විශ්ලේෂණය ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරීයාවට වැදගත් වැඩක්. ඉතින් ඉතින් ඉතින් ඉතින් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විධානයේ බලන්න ඉගෙනගන්න පාර්ඩිග්ම් අඩුයි. නමුත්, මිනිස්සුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් බොරු වෙන්න පුළුවන්. ඉතින්, අපි දැනුම් විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා වඩා දුර්වල බලන්න පුළුවන්. මේ පැත්තට, අපි පිටිපස්සේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ ක්\u200dරියාමාර්ගයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් විදිහට පරීක්ෂා විශේෂණය කරනවා  පොස්ටරියෝර් සාමාන්\u200dය විස්තරය පිටිපස්සේ විස්තරය තමයි විස්තරයෙන් පිටිපස්සු විස්තරයෙන් පිටිපස්සු විස්තරයෙන් ව අපේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ පස්සේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂණය ප්\u200dරතිචාර විශේෂණය විශේෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200d', 'sv': 'Känsleanalys är en viktig uppgift i naturlig språkbehandling (NLP). De flesta befintliga toppmoderna metoder är under det övervakade lärandeparadigmet. Människans anteckningar kan dock vara knappa. Därför bör vi utnyttja en svagare tillsyn för sentimentalanalys. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en posterior regularisering ramverk för variationsstrategin till svagt övervakad sentimentalanalys för att bättre kontrollera den posteriora fördelningen av etiketttilldelningen. Intuitionen bakom den bakre regulariseringen är att om extraherade åsiktsord från två dokument är semantiskt likartade, bör den bakre fördelningen av två dokument vara likartad. Våra experimentella resultat visar att den posteriora regulariseringen kan förbättra den ursprungliga variationsstrategin till den svagt övervakade sentimentalanalysen och prestandan är stabilare med mindre förutsägelsevarians.', 'sr': 'Analiza sentimenta je važan zadatak u procesu prirodnog jezika (NLP). Većina postojećih metoda umjetnosti su pod nadzornim paradigmom učenja. Međutim, ljudske annotacije mogu biti manje. Zato bi trebali uticati na slabije nadzore za analizu sentimenta. U ovom papiru predlažemo poslednji okvir regularizacije variacionalnog pristupa slabom nadziranom analizu sentiment a kako bi bolje kontrolirali poslednju distribuciju zadataka etiketa. intuicija iza poslednje regularizacije je da ako su riječi iz dva dokumenta izvučene mišljenje semantički slične, poslednja raspodjela dva dokumenta treba biti slična. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da poslednja regularizacija može poboljšati originalni variacionalni pristup slabom nadziranom analizu sentimenta i da je izvedba stabilnija sa manjim varijacijom predviđanja.', 'ur': 'Sentiment analysis is an important task in natural language processing (NLP). اکثر موجود موجود موجود آهنت کے طریقے پر نظر رکھے جاتے ہیں. لیکن انسان کی آواز کم ہو سکتی ہے۔ اسی طرح، ہم احساس تحلیل کے لئے زیادہ کمزور نظر کے ذریعہ اضافہ کریں۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے ایک پوسٹریور قانونی فرمود کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جو کمزور نظارت کی احساسات تحلیل کے لئے مختلف طریقے کے لئے مختلف طریقے کے لئے ہے کہ لیبل واحد کے پچھلے تقسیم کو بہتر کنترل کریں۔ پوسٹریوری قانونی کے پیچھے نظر یہ ہے کہ اگر دو سندментوں سے نظر لکھائی لکھائی لکھی جاتی ہیں تو دو سندментوں کے پچھلے تقسیم برابر ہونا چاہیے۔ ہمارے آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ پوسٹریوری قانون کی تغییرات کمزور نظر رکھی ہوئی احساسات تحلیل کے لئے آغاز کرسکتی ہے اور عملکرد چھوٹی تغییرات سے زیادہ ثابت ہے.', 'ta': 'சாதாரண மொழி செயல்பாட்டில் ஒரு முக்கியமான செயல்பாடு (NLP). தற்போதைய நிலையில் பெரும்பாலான கலை முறைகள் கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் அளபுருவில் உள்ளன. ஆனால், மனித குறிப்புகள் குறைவாக இருக்க முடியும். எனவே, நாம் உணர்வு ஆராய்ச்சிக்கு மிகவும் பலஹீனமான கண்காணிப்பு கொடுக்க வேண்டும். இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு போட்ரியர் கட்டுப்பாட்டு சட்டத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் மாறுபாடு செயல்படுத்தப்பட்ட உணர்வு ஆராய்வுக்கு மாற பின்வரிசை கட்டுப்பாட்டிற்கு பின்னால் உள்ள உணர்வு என்னவென்றால் இரண்டு ஆவணங்களிலிருந்து வெளியிட்ட கருத்து வார்த்தைகள் போன்ற எங்கள் சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது பின்வரும் விதிமாறுபாட்டு மாறிகளை மேம்படுத்த முடியும் என்று காட்டுகிறது பலஹீனமாக கண்கா', 'vi': 'Bản phân tích cảm xúc là một nhiệm vụ quan trọng trong việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Hầu hết các phương pháp hiện đại đều nằm dưới hệ thống học được giám sát. Tuy nhiên, ghi chú con người rất hiếm. Chúng ta nên thúc đẩy sự giám sát yếu hơn cho việc phân tích tình cảm. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một hệ thống chỉnh sửa sau cùng cho các phương pháp khác nhau về phân tích cảm xúc thiếu người giám sát để kiểm soát tốt hơn việc phân phối sau của nhãn. Trực giác đằng sau việc điều chỉnh là nếu những từ ngữ quan điểm từ hai tài liệu được rút ra theo ngữ nghĩa giống nhau, thì các phân phát sau của hai tài liệu phải giống nhau. Những kết quả thử nghiệm của chúng ta cho thấy rằng kết quả chính xác sau có thể cải thiện cách tiếp cận đa dạng gốc của phân tích cảm xúc thiếu người giám sát và hiệu suất ổn định hơn với âm tính dự đoán nhỏ hơn.', 'uz': "Sentiment analysis is a natural language processing (NLP) muhim vazifasi. Ko'pchilik mavjud shaxsiy usullar o'rganish parametrlaridan himoyalangan. Lekin, inson tajribalari kam bo'lishi mumkin. Shunday qilib, biz hissiyotni analyzerga ko'proq narsalarni qo'shish kerak. Bu qogʻozda, biz o'zgarishni o'zgartirish qoidasining o'zgarishni o'zgartiraymiz, o'zgarishni o'zgartirish qoidasidagi o'zgarishni o'zgartiradik, o'zgarishni o'zgartirish qo'llanmagan qo'llanmalarning keyingi ajratishni bosh Keyinroq boshqaruvchining chegarasining fikri shuki, agar ikki hujjatdan tashqi so'zlarni kichkinak o'xshash bo'lsa, ikki hujjatning keyingi ajratilgan bir xil tarqatishi huddi bo'lishi kerak. Bizning tajriba natijalarimiz esa keyingi boshqaruvchilar o'zgarishning asl o'zgarishlarini o'zgartirishi mumkin va cheksiz o'zgarishni o'zgartirish mumkin va bajarishimiz chegara bo'ladi.", 'bg': 'Анализът на сентимента е важна задача в обработката на естествения език (НЛП). Повечето от съществуващите съвременни методи са под парадигмата на обучението под надзор. Въпреки това, човешките анотации могат да бъдат оскъдни. По този начин трябва да използваме по-слаб надзор за анализ на сентимента. В настоящата статия ние предлагаме рамка за последваща регулировка на вариационния подход към слабо контролирания сентиментален анализ, за да се контролира по-добре последващото разпределение на етикета. Интуицията зад последващата регулировка е, че ако извлечените мнения от два документа са семантично сходни, последващите разпределения на два документа трябва да бъдат сходни. Нашите експериментални резултати показват, че последващата регулировка може да подобри оригиналния вариационен подход към слабо контролирания сентиментален анализ и ефективността е по-стабилна с по-малка вариация на прогнозирането.', 'nl': 'Sentiment analyse is een belangrijke taak in natuurlijke taalverwerking (NLP). De meeste bestaande state-of-the-art methoden vallen onder het begeleide leerparadigma. Menselijke annotaties kunnen echter schaars zijn. Daarom moeten we zwakker toezicht inzetten voor sentimentanalyse. In dit artikel stellen we een posterior regularisatie framework voor voor de variantionele benadering van de zwak begeleide sentimentanalyse om de posterior verdeling van de labeltoewijzing beter te controleren. De intuïtie achter de posterior regularisatie is dat als geëxtraheerde opiniewoorden uit twee documenten semantisch vergelijkbaar zijn, de posterior distributies van twee documenten vergelijkbaar moeten zijn. Onze experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat de posteriore regularisatie de oorspronkelijke variantionele benadering van de zwak begeleide sentimentanalyse kan verbeteren en dat de prestaties stabieler zijn met kleinere voorspellingsvariantie.', 'da': 'Følelsesanalyse er en vigtig opgave i naturlig sprogbehandling (NLP). De fleste eksisterende state-of-the-art metoder er under det overvågede læringsparadigme. Men menneskelige noteringer kan være knappe. Derfor bør vi udnytte mere svagt tilsyn med følelsesanalysen. I denne artikel foreslår vi en posterior regularisering ramme for variabel tilgang til den svagt overvågede sentimentalanalyse for bedre at kontrollere den posteriore fordeling af etikettildelingen. Intuitionen bag den bageste regulering er, at hvis udvundne meningsord fra to dokumenter semantisk ligner hinanden, bør de bageste fordelinger af to dokumenter være ens. Vores eksperimentelle resultater viser, at den bagerste regulering kan forbedre den oprindelige variationstilgang til den svagt overvågede sentimentalanalyse og ydelsen er mere stabil med mindre forudsigelsesvariant.', 'hr': 'Analiza posla je važan zadatak u procesu prirodnog jezika (NLP). Većina postojećih metoda umjetnosti pod nadzornim paradigmom učenja. Međutim, ljudske annotacije mogu biti manje. Zato bi trebali utjecati na slabije nadzore za analizu osjećaja. U ovom papiru predlažemo posljednji okvir regularizacije variacionalnog pristupa slabom nadziranom analizu osjećaja kako bi bolje kontrolirali posljednju distribuciju zadataka etiketa. intuicija iza posljednje regularizacije je da ako su riječi iz dva dokumenta izvučene mišljenje semantički slične, posljednja raspodjela dva dokumenta treba biti slična. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da posljednja regularizacija može poboljšati originalni variacionalni pristup slabom nadziranom analizu osjećaja i učinkovitost je stabilniji s manjim varijancijom predviđanja.', 'de': 'Die Stimmungsanalyse ist eine wichtige Aufgabe in der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache (NLP). Die meisten existierenden State-of-the-Art Methoden stehen unter dem überwachten Lernparadigma. Menschliche Anmerkungen können jedoch rar sein. Daher sollten wir eine schwächere Aufsicht für die Stimmungsanalyse nutzen. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir ein posteriores Regularisierungsrahmen für den Variationsansatz der schwach überwachten Sentiment-Analyse vor, um die posteriore Verteilung der Etikettenzuweisung besser kontrollieren zu können. Die Intuition hinter der posterioren Regularisierung ist, dass, wenn extrahierte Meinungswörter aus zwei Dokumenten semantisch ähnlich sind, die posterioren Verteilungen von zwei Dokumenten ähnlich sein sollten. Unsere experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die posteriore Regularisierung den ursprünglichen Variationsansatz der schwach überwachten Sentimentanalyse verbessern kann und die Performance bei geringerer Vorhersagevarianz stabiler ist.', 'id': 'Analisis perasaan adalah tugas penting dalam proses bahasa alami (NLP). Kebanyakan metode terbaik yang ada di bawah paradigma belajar yang diawasi. Namun, anotasi manusia bisa sedikit. Thus, we should leverage more weak supervision for sentiment analysis.  Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan cadangan regularisasi posterior untuk pendekatan variasi untuk analisis sentimen yang terlepas mengawasi lebih baik untuk mengendalikan distribusi posterior tugas label. Intuisi di belakang regularisasi posterior adalah bahwa jika kata-kata pendapat ekstrakt dari dua dokumen secara semantis sama, distribusi posterior dari dua dokumen harus sama. Hasil percobaan kami menunjukkan bahwa regularisasi posterior dapat meningkatkan pendekatan variasi asli untuk analisis sentimen yang terlepas mengawasi dan prestasi lebih stabil dengan variasi prediksi yang lebih kecil.', 'ko': '감정 분석은 자연 언어 처리의 중요한 임무이다.기존의 대다수 가장 선진적인 방법은 모두 감독 학습 모델에서 진행된 것이다.그러나 인류의 주석은 매우 적을 수도 있다.따라서 더 약한 감독을 이용해 정서 분석을 해야 한다.본고에서 우리는 약한 감독 정서 분석의 변분 방법을 위해 백엔드 정규화 구조를 제시하여 라벨 분배의 백엔드 분포를 더욱 잘 통제한다.백업 정규화 배후의 직감은 두 문서에서 추출한 의견어가 의미적으로 비슷하다면 두 문서의 백업 분포는 비슷해야 한다는 것이다.우리의 실험 결과에 의하면 후험 정규화 방법은 원래의 변분 방법을 개선하여 약한 감독 정서 분석에 적용하고 예측 방차가 비교적 적은 상황에서 성능을 더욱 안정적으로 할 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa muda unachambua kazi muhimu katika upasuaji wa lugha asilia (NLP). Matawala mengi ya hali ya sanaa yanayopo chini ya utawala wa kujifunza. Hata hivyo, matatizo ya binadamu yanaweza kuwa nadra. Kwa hiyo, tunapaswa kutumia ufuatiliaji dhaifu zaidi kwa uchambuzi wa hisia. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mfumo wa udhibiti wa mabadiliko wa namna mbadala ya uchambuzi wa hisia uliotangaliwa dhaifu ili kudhibiti usambazaji wa bango. Mtazamo nyuma ya kudhibiti nyaraka hizo za baadae ni kwamba kama maneno yaliyotoa maoni kutoka kwenye nyaraka mbili yanafanana kwa kiasi kikubwa, usambazaji wa nyaraka mbili za mabango yanapaswa kuwa sawa. Matokeo yetu ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa utaratibu wa baadae unaweza kuboresha mbinu za asili za mabadiliko kwa uchambuzi wa hisia ulioangaliwa dhaifu na utendaji huu unakuwa imara zaidi na tofauti ndogo ya kutabiri.', 'fa': 'تحلیل فرستادگان یک کار مهم در پرداخت زبان طبیعی (NLP) است. بیشترین روش\u200cهای موجود هنری زیر پارادیگ آموزش تحت نظر است. با این حال، اخطار انسان کم می\u200cتواند باشد. بنابراین، ما باید بررسی ضعیف تر برای تحلیل احساسات را تحت تاثیر قرار دهیم. در این کاغذ، ما یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار نظر پشت ساده\u200cسازی پشتیبانی این است که اگر کلمات نظر را از دو سند خارج می\u200cکنند به طور طبیعی شبیه هستند، تقسیم پشتیبانی دو سند باید شبیه باشند. نتیجه آزمایشی ما نشان می دهد که تغییر قانونی پشت سر می تواند دستور متفاوتی اصلی را به تحلیل احساسات ضعیف تحت نظر قرار دهد و انجام با تغییر پیش بینی کوچکتر ثابت تر است.', 'tr': 'Sentiment analizi tebigy dil işlemesinde wajyp täze bir zadyr (NLP). Öň bar ýagdaýyň köp bölegi öwrenmek paradigmanyň astynda. Ýöne adam duýdurmalary ýok bolup biler. Şol sebäpli, duýgular analyzasynda biraz zayıf gözetligi etmäge rugsat bermeli. Bu kagyzda, biz etiketleriň arkasyndaky zadynyň beýleki weziplerini gowy kontrol etmek üçin soňra düzenli düzenlenme çerçevesini teklip edýäris. Gadymky düzümlenmeniň arkasynda pikir eden sözleriň sözleri semantik ýaly bolsa, diňe iki senediň daýlamaklary meňzeş bolmalydyr. Biziň experimental netijelerimiz soňky düzenlemegiň özüniň üýtgeşik duýgularyň analyzasyna görä üýtgeşik duýgularyň çözümlerini gowurap biler we netijelerimiz kiçi çaklama wajyplygy bilen has stabilikdir.', 'af': "Sentiment analiseer is 'n belangrike taak in natuurlike taal verwerking (NLP). Die meeste van bestaande state-of-the-art metodes is onder die superviseerde leer paradigme. Maar menslike notasies kan skaars wees. Daarom moet ons meer swakke supervisie vir sentimentanalisie vervolg. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n posterior regularisasie raamwerk vir die variasionale toegang tot die swak ondersoekte sentimentanalisie om die posterior verspreiding van die etiket toewysing beter te beheer. Die intuisie agter die posterior regularisasie is dat as uitgevoerde besonderhede woorde van twee dokumente semantiese gelykbaar is, moet die posterior verspreidings van twee dokumente gelykbaar wees. Ons eksperimentale resultate wys dat die posterior regularisasie die oorspronklike variasionale toegang kan verbeter tot die swak ondersoekte sentimentanalisie en die prestasie is meer stabile met kleiner voorskou variasie.", 'sq': 'Analiza e ndjenjave është një detyrë e rëndësishme në procesimin natyror të gjuhës (NLP). Shumica e metodave ekzistuese janë nën paradigm ën e mbikqyrur të mësimit. Megjithatë, anotacionet njerëzore mund të jenë të pakta. Kështu, ne duhet të nxjerrim mbikqyrje më të dobët për analizën e ndjenjave. In this paper, we propose a posterior regularization framework for the variational approach to the weakly supervised sentiment analysis to better control the posterior distribution of the label assignment.  Intuicioni prapa rregullalizimit posterior është se nëse fjalët e nxjerra të opinionit nga dy dokumente janë semantikisht të ngjashme, shpërndarjet posteriore të dy dokumenteve duhet të jenë të ngjashme. Rezultatet tona eksperimentale tregojnë se rregullalizimi posterior mund të përmirësojë metodën origjinale variacionale ndaj analizës së ndjenjave të mbikqyrura dobësisht dhe performanca është më e qëndrueshme me variancë më të vogël parashikimi.', 'az': 'Sentiment analizi təbii dil işləməsində mövcuddur (NLP). Ən çox mövcuddur sanat metodları gözləyir öyrənmə paradigmi altında. Ancaq insan danışmaları az olar. Beləliklə, hisslər analizi üçün daha zəif gözləmə mümkün olmalıyıq. Bu kağızda, etiketin sonrakı dağıtını daha yaxşı kontrol etmək üçün, zəif gözləyirli hisslər analizi üçün dəyişiklik tərzlərinin ardınca düzgün düzgün tərzini təklif edirik. Əgər iki belədən alınan fikir sözləri semantik olaraq eyni ola bilərsə, iki belədin sonrakı dağıtılması eyni olmalı. Bizim təcrübəmiz sonuçlarımız sonrakı düzgün təcrübə etmək zəif gözləyirli hisslər analizi üçün orijinal dəyişiklik tərzini yaxşılaşdıra bilər və təcrübə daha kiçik təcrübə dəyişiklikləri ilə daha stabildir.', 'hy': 'Զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը շատ կարևոր խնդիր է բնական լեզվի վերլուծում: Գոյություն ունեցող ամենաբարձր մեթոդների մեծ մասը վերահսկված ուսուցման պարադիգմայի տակ է: Այնուամենայնիվ, մարդկային նկարագրությունները կարող են հազվադեպ լինել: Այսպիսով, մենք պետք է ավելի թույլ վերահսկողություն օգտագործենք զգացմունքների վերլուծության համար: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք հետագա վերահսկողական կառուցվածք՝ թույլ վերահսկված զգացմունքների վերլուծության տարբերակային մոտեցումների համար, որպեսզի ավելի լավ վերահսկենք պիտակի վերահսկողական բաշխման վերահսկողությունը: Եթե երկու փաստաթղթերից հանված կարծիքի բառերը սեմանտիկապես նման են, երկու փաստաթղթերի հետևի տարածումը պետք է նման լինի: Մեր փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ հետագա ռեգուլարիզացիան կարող է բարելավել թույլ վերահսկված զգացմունքների վերլուծության սկզբնական տարբերակային մոտեցումը, և արդյունքը ավելի կայուն է ավելի փոքր կանխատեսման տարբերակի հետ:', 'am': 'የተፈጥሮ ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ (NLP) የተጠቃሚ ስራ ነው፡፡ የአሁኑ ሁኔታ የ-አርእስት ሥርዓት በተጠበቀው ትምህርት ግንኙነት ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን የሰው ግጭት ጥቂት ሲሆን ይችላል፡፡ ስለዚህም በአሳማሚ አስተያየት የደካማ ስልጣንን እናሳድጋለን፡፡ In this paper, we propose a posterior regularization framework for the variational approach to the weakly supervised sentiment analysis to better control the posterior distribution of the label assignment.  ከሁለቱ ሰነዶች የውይይት ቃላት በሁለት ሰነዶች ላይ የተለየ እንደሆነ፣ በሁለቱ ሰነዶች ላይ የተለየ የውጤት ክፍል ብጤት ነው፡፡ ፈተና ፍሬዎቻችን በኋላው የመግለጫ ሥርዓት ወደ ደካማዎች የተመለከተውን የልዩ ልዩ ልዩነት እንዲያበጅል እና የግንኙነታችን ትንሽ ትንሽ ትንቢት ፍትሕርት የተለየ ትክክል ነው፡፡', 'bn': 'সেন্টাইমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণ প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ায় একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কাজ (এনএলপি)। বেশীরভাগ বিদ্যমান রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের পদ্ধতি শিক্ষা প্যারাডিমের অধীনে রয়েছে। কিন্তু মানুষের বিরক্তি খুব কম হতে পারে। তাই আমাদের অনুভূতিবিশ্লেষণের জন্য আরো দুর্বল পর্যবেক্ষণের সাহায্য করা উচিত। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি পোস্ট্রিয়ার নিয়ন্ত্রণ কার্যক্রম প্রস্তাব করছি যারা দুর্বল পর্যবেক্ষিত মনোভাব বিশ্লেষণের কাছে বিভিন্ন উপায় নিয়ন্ত্রণ করে  পোস্টারের নিয়ন্ত্রণের পেছনের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি হলো যদি দুই নথির থেকে মতামতের কথা বের করা হয়, তাহলে দুটি নথির বিতরণের পোস্টার বিতরণের দুটি  আমাদের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে পোস্টারের নিয়ন্ত্রণ নিয়ন্ত্রণের ক্ষেত্রে দুর্বল অনুভূতির বিশ্লেষণের মূল ভেরিয়ারিয়েটিভারেশনের ক্ষে', 'cs': 'Sentimentní analýza je důležitým úkolem při zpracování přirozeného jazyka (NLP). Většina stávajících nejmodernějších metod je pod paradigmatem dohledu. Nicméně lidské anotace mohou být vzácné. Měli bychom tedy využít slabší dohled pro analýzu sentimentů. V tomto článku navrhujeme posteriorní regularizační rámec pro variační přístup k slabě dohlížené sentimentní analýze pro lepší kontrolu posteriorní distribuce přiřazení etiket. Intuití za posteriorní regularizací je, že pokud extrahovaná názorová slova ze dvou dokumentů jsou sémanticky podobná, zadní distribuce dvou dokumentů by měla být podobná. Naše experimentální výsledky ukazují, že posteriorní regularizace může zlepšit původní variační přístup k slabě dohlížené sentimentní analýze a výkon je stabilnější s menší predikční variací.', 'bs': 'Analiza posla je važan zadatak u procesu prirodnog jezika (NLP). Većina postojećih metoda umjetnosti su pod nadzornim paradigmom učenja. Međutim, ljudske annotacije mogu biti manje. Zato bi trebali utjecati na slabije nadzore za analizu osjećaja. U ovom papiru predlažemo poslednji okvir regularizacije za variacionalni pristup slabom nadziranom analizu osjećaja kako bi bolje kontrolirali poslednju distribuciju zadataka etikete. intuicija iza poslednje regularizacije je da ako su riječi iz dva dokumenta izvučene mišljenje semantički slične, poslednja raspodjela dva dokumenta treba biti slična. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da poslednja regularizacija može poboljšati originalni variacionalni pristup slabom nadzornom analizu osjećaja i da je izvedba stabilnija sa manjim varijancijom predviđanja.', 'et': 'Sentimentide analüüs on oluline ülesanne looduskeele töötlemisel (NLP). Enamik olemasolevatest state-of-the-art meetoditest on juhendatud õppimise paradigma. Inimeste märkused võivad siiski vähe olla. Seega peaksime tundete analüüsimiseks võimendama nõrgamat järelevalvet. Käesolevas töös pakume välja hilisema regulatsiooniraamistiku nõrgalt kontrollitud sentimentaalüüsi variatsioonilisele lähenemisele, et paremini kontrollida etiketi määramise hilisemat jaotumist. Järgneva regulariseerimise taga on intuitsioon, et kui kahest dokumendist ekstraheeritud arvamussõnad on semantiliselt sarnased, peaksid kahe dokumendi tagasijaotused olema sarnased. Meie eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et hilisem regulatsioon võib parandada esialgset variatsioonilist lähenemisviisi nõrgalt järelevalvetud sentimentaalüüsi ja tulemuslikkus on stabiilsem väiksema prognoosi dispersiooniga.', 'ca': "L'an àlisi del sentiment és una tasca important en el processament natural del llenguatge (NLP). La majoria dels mètodes actuals existents estan sota el paradigma d'aprenentatge supervisat. Però les anotacions humanes poden ser escases. Així que hauríem d'aprofitar una supervisió més dèbil per a l'anàlisi de sentiments. En aquest paper, proposem un marc de regularizació posterior per l'enfocament variacional a l'anàlisi de sentiments debilment supervisada per controlar millor la distribució posterior de l'asignació d'etiqueta. La intuïció darrere de la regularizació posterior és que si les paraules d'opinió extraïdes de dos documents són semànticament similars, les distribucions posteriors de dos documents haurien de ser similars. Els nostres resultats experimentals mostren que la regularizació posterior pot millorar l'enfocament variacional original a l'anàlisi de sentiments debidament supervisada i el rendiment és més estable amb més petita variança de predicció.", 'fi': 'Tunteanalyysi on tärkeä tehtävä luonnollisen kielen käsittelyssä (NLP). Suurin osa nykyisistä huippuluokan menetelmistä on ohjatun oppimisen paradigman alaisia. Ihmisten huomautuksia voi kuitenkin olla vähän. Näin ollen meidän pitäisi hyödyntää heikkoa valvontaa tunteiden analysoinnissa. Tässä työssä ehdotamme myöhempää säännöstelyä heikosti valvotun sentimentaalianalyysin variaatiolähestymistavalle, jotta etikettien myöhempää jakautumista voitaisiin hallita paremmin. Jälkimmäisen säännöstelyn taustalla on intuitio, että jos kahdesta asiakirjasta poimitut mielipiteet ovat semanttisesti samankaltaisia, kahden asiakirjan myöhempien jakaumien tulisi olla samanlaisia. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että jälkimmäinen regularisaatio voi parantaa alkuperäistä variaatiolähestymistapaa heikosti valvottuun sentimentaalianalyysiin ja suorituskyky on vakaampi pienemmällä ennustevarianssilla.', 'jv': 'structural navigation Saiki ono Nanging, dadine pancene iso kelalaman apik. Punika, awak dhéwé kudu beraksi luwih akeh seneng nggawe akeh perbudhakan kanggo anawisan luwih. Nang mapun iki, kita enyeste akeh peugot mrogram nggawe aturan mrogram kuwi tindang karo perusahaan karo hal-hal dadi kaé nguasai paten sing nguasai nggawe nguasai tindakan sektor sektor nggawe nambah akeh etiket. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem punika diwé Awak dhéwé éntuk perbudhakan winih sing gak bener tentang karo akeh basa sing nguasai perbudhakan langkung sampek bantuan ingkang kelangan winih dhéwé karo hal-sampek sing gak dhéwé karo perbudhakan sing paling dhéwé.', 'sk': 'Analiza čustva je pomembna naloga pri obdelavi naravnega jezika (NLP). Večina obstoječih najsodobnejših metod je pod paradigmo nadzorovanega učenja. Toda človeške opombe so lahko malo. Zato bi morali izkoristiti šibkejši nadzor za analizo čustva. V prispevku predlagamo okvir za kasnejšo regulacijo variacijskega pristopa k šibko nadzorovani analizi sentimenta, da bi bolje nadzorovali kasnejšo porazdelitev nalepke. Intuitija za kasnejšo ureditvijo je, da če so izvlečene mnenjske besede iz dveh dokumentov semantično podobne, bi morale biti kasnejša porazdelitev dveh dokumentov podobna. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da lahko kasnejša regulacija izboljša originalni variacijski pristop k šibko nadzorovani analizi sentimenta in da je zmogljivost stabilnejša z manjšo varianco napovedi.', 'ha': "Ana sakan da aka sanar da wani aikin da aka yi aiki a cikin aikin harshen kwanza (NLP). Babu mafi yawan hanyoyin-halin-sanar sunan tsare da aka tsare. However, human annotations can be scarce.  Kayya, sai mu ƙara idãnunsa mafi rauni ga analyza na hisia. Daga wannan takardan, Munã goyyade wani firam na jurista ta postero wa mazaɓa wa mazaɓa zuwa analytan wanda aka yi rauni na bincike don ya fi zama mafi canza su yi mamlaka ga rabo-dabar. Cincin bakin tarajin bakin wani takardar poster yana cẽwa, idan an fitar magana na sharuya daga takardar biyu, su zama daidai da misãlin, sai ya kamata raba rabon bayanin biyu. Matarinmu na jarrabi ya nũna cewa, jujjarin bakin bayani yana iya improve hanyari na farko zuwa Ana-Ana-na-mala'ani masu rauni da aka tsare na, kuma aikin ya fi tabbatacce da rabo mafi ƙaranci ga basĩri.", 'he': 'Sentiment analysis is an important task in natural language processing (NLP).  רוב השיטות המאומנות הקיומות נמצאות תחת הפרדיגמה של הלימודים המבוטחת. עם זאת, הערות אנושיות יכולות להיות נדירות. ככה, אנחנו צריכים להשתמש בפיקוח חלש יותר לניתוח רגשות. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מסגרת רפובליזציה מאחורית לגישה ההתנגשות לניתוח הרגשות המבוקח בחולשה כדי לשלוט טוב יותר בהפצה האחורית של משימה התווית. האינטואיציה מאחורי התקנה האחורית היא שאם מילים דעה מווצאות משני מסמכים דומות באופן סמנטי, ההפצה האחורית של שני מסמכים צריכה להיות דומה. התוצאות הניסיוניות שלנו מראות שהתקנות האחורית יכולה לשפר את הגישה המקורית של ההתנהגות לניתוח הרגשות המבוקח חלש והביצועים יציבים יותר עם שינוי צפוי קטן יותר.', 'bo': 'གཏན་རྐྱེན་དུས་ཡོད་པའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ནི་རང་རུང་སྐད་ཀྱི་ལས་སྦྱོར་ནང་ལ་གལ་ཆེ་བ་ཞིག་རེད གནས་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་གནས་སྟངས་མང་ཆེ་བ་དེ་ལྟ་རྟོག་པའི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཕྱོགས་སྟོན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། མི་རིག་གི་སྐོར་ལ་ཉུང་བར་ཆེ་བ་ཞིག་ཡིན། དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཚོར་སྐྱེན་པས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ལྟ་རྟོག་བཙལ་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་ཡིན། འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་རྗེས་སུ་གྲངས་སུ་རྗེས་ཀྱི་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཅིག་གི་གནད་དོན་ལྟ་བུའི་མཐུན་སྣེ་ཚོགས་སྟངས་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ར རྒྱབ་གཞུང་གི་རྗེས་སུ་ཡིག་ཆ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་གསལ་བཤད་པ་དེ་ཚེ། ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་གྲུབ'}
{'en': 'Cognition-aware Cognate Detection', 'pt': 'Detecção de cognatos com reconhecimento de cognição', 'fr': 'Détection des objets apparentés sensible à la cognition', 'es': 'Detección de cognados consciente de la cognición', 'ja': 'コグニション認識コグネイト検出', 'ar': 'كشف الإدراك الإدراكي', 'zh': '识感知同源检测', 'ga': 'Brath gaolmhar ar an eolas', 'hi': 'अनुभूति-जागरूक संज्ञानात्मक पता लगाना', 'ru': 'Когнитивно-ориентированное когнатное обнаружение', 'el': 'Αναγνώριση γνώσεων', 'kk': 'Когнатты анықтау', 'ka': 'Cognition-aware Cognate Detection', 'hu': 'Kognitációtudatos Cognate Detection', 'it': 'Rilevamento cognitivo consapevole', 'ms': 'Cognition-aware Cognate Detection', 'mk': 'Детектирање на познавањето', 'mt': 'Sejbien ta’ Kognat konxju mill-għarfien', 'lt': 'Žinomas pažinimas', 'no': 'Cognate-oppdaging for kognition-aware', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie poznawcze świadome poznania', 'ro': 'Detectarea cognitivă conștientă de cunoaștere', 'ml': 'തിരിച്ചറിയുന്ന കോഗ്നേറ്റ് ഡിറ്റിക്റ്റീഷന്\u200d', 'mn': 'Cognate Detection', 'si': 'Cogonate හොයාගන්න', 'so': 'Aqoonsashada aqoonsiga', 'sr': 'Svjestan kognicijski detektiv kogneta', 'sv': 'Kognitionsmedveten kognitionsdetektion', 'ta': 'தெரியும் குறியீட்டு கண்டுபிடிப்பு', 'ur': 'Cognition-aware Cognate Detection', 'uz': 'Sertifikat tafsilotlari...', 'vi': 'Phát hiện tác dụng', 'da': 'Kognitionsbevidst kognitionsdetektion', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje kognicije', 'nl': 'Cognitiebewuste cognitiedetectie', 'bg': 'Когнитно разпознаване', 'id': 'Pengetahuan Pengetahuan Pengetahuan Pengetahuan', 'de': 'Kognitionsbewusste Kognitionserkennung', 'fa': 'شناسایی Cognate', 'af': 'Kognition-aware Cognate Deteksie', 'sw': 'Kugundua Usomaji wa Kitambua', 'tr': 'Cognate Deteksi', 'hy': 'Գիտելուց գիտակցած Գիտելուց հետո', 'sq': 'Detektimi i njohjes së njohjes', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'az': 'Cognition-aware Cognate Detection', 'bn': 'পরিচিতি- সচেতন কোনো সনাক্তি', 'bs': 'Svjestan kognicijski otkrivanje kogneta', 'ko': '인지 감지 동원 검측', 'cs': 'Kognitivní detekce', 'et': 'Kognitsiooniteadlik kognitiivse tuvastamine', 'ca': 'Detecció de coneixements conscients', 'fi': 'Kognitiivinen kognitiivinen tunnistus', 'jv': 'Cogonate', 'he': 'זיהוי מודע לזהות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Kognicijsko zaznavanje', 'bo': 'Cognition-aware Cognate Detection'}
{'en': 'Automatic detection of cognates helps downstream NLP tasks of Machine Translation, Cross-lingual Information Retrieval, Computational Phylogenetics and Cross-lingual Named Entity Recognition. Previous approaches for the task of cognate detection use orthographic, phonetic and semantic similarity based features sets. In this paper, we propose a novel method for enriching the feature sets, with cognitive features extracted from human readers’ gaze behaviour. We collect gaze behaviour data for a small sample of cognates and show that extracted cognitive features help the task of cognate detection. However, gaze data collection and annotation is a costly task. We use the collected gaze behaviour data to predict cognitive features for a larger sample and show that predicted cognitive features, also, significantly improve the task performance. We report improvements of 10 % with the collected gaze features, and 12 % using the predicted gaze features, over the previously proposed approaches. Furthermore, we release the collected gaze behaviour data along with our code and cross-lingual models.', 'ar': 'يساعد الكشف التلقائي عن cognates في مهام معالجة اللغات الطبيعية (NLP) النهائية للترجمة الآلية ، واسترجاع المعلومات عبر اللغات ، وعلم الوراثة الحسابي ، والتعرف على الكيانات المسماة عبر اللغات. تستخدم المناهج السابقة لمهمة الكشف المشابه مجموعات الميزات الإملائية والصوتية والدلالية القائمة على التشابه. في هذا البحث ، نقترح طريقة جديدة لإثراء مجموعات الميزات ، بسمات معرفية مستخرجة من سلوك نظر القراء البشريين. نقوم بجمع بيانات سلوك النظرة لعينة صغيرة من المتشابهين ونبين أن الميزات المعرفية المستخرجة تساعد في مهمة الاكتشاف المعرفي. ومع ذلك ، فإن جمع بيانات التحديق والتعليق التوضيحي مهمة مكلفة. نحن نستخدم بيانات سلوك النظرة التي تم جمعها للتنبؤ بالسمات المعرفية لعينة أكبر وإظهار أن الميزات المعرفية المتوقعة تعمل أيضًا على تحسين أداء المهمة بشكل كبير. أبلغنا عن تحسينات بنسبة 10 ٪ مع ميزات النظرة المجمعة ، و 12 ٪ باستخدام ميزات النظرة المتوقعة ، على الأساليب المقترحة سابقًا. علاوة على ذلك ، نقوم بإصدار بيانات سلوك النظرة التي تم جمعها جنبًا إلى جنب مع الكود الخاص بنا والنماذج متعددة اللغات.', 'es': 'La detección automática de cognados ayuda a reducir las tareas de PNL de traducción automática, recuperación de información en varios idiomas, filogenética computacional y reconocimiento de entidades nombradas en varios idiomas. Los enfoques anteriores para la tarea de detección afín utilizan conjuntos de características basados en similitudes ortográficas, fonéticas y semánticas. En este artículo, proponemos un método novedoso para enriquecer los conjuntos de características, con características cognitivas extraídas del comportamiento de la mirada de los lectores humanos. Recopilamos datos sobre el comportamiento de la mirada para una pequeña muestra de cognados y demostramos que las características cognitivas extraídas ayudan a la tarea de detección de cognados. Sin embargo, la recopilación y anotación de datos de mirada es una tarea costosa. Utilizamos los datos recopilados sobre el comportamiento de la mirada para predecir las características cognitivas para una muestra más grande y demostrar que las características cognitivas previstas también mejoran significativamente el rendimiento de la tarea. Reportamos mejoras del 10% con las funciones de mirada recopiladas y del 12% con las funciones de mirada previstas, con respecto a los enfoques propuestos anteriormente. Además, publicamos los datos recopilados sobre el comportamiento de la mirada junto con nuestro código y modelos multilingües.', 'pt': 'A detecção automática de cognatos ajuda nas tarefas de PNL de tradução automática, recuperação de informações em vários idiomas, filogenética computacional e reconhecimento de entidades nomeadas em vários idiomas. Abordagens anteriores para a tarefa de detecção de cognatos usam conjuntos de recursos baseados em similaridade ortográfica, fonética e semântica. Neste artigo, propomos um novo método para enriquecer os conjuntos de recursos, com recursos cognitivos extraídos do comportamento do olhar dos leitores humanos. Coletamos dados de comportamento do olhar para uma pequena amostra de cognatos e mostramos que os recursos cognitivos extraídos ajudam na tarefa de detecção de cognatos. No entanto, a coleta e anotação de dados do olhar é uma tarefa cara. Usamos os dados de comportamento do olhar coletados para prever características cognitivas para uma amostra maior e mostramos que as características cognitivas previstas também melhoram significativamente o desempenho da tarefa. Relatamos melhorias de 10% com os recursos de olhar coletados e 12% usando os recursos de olhar previstos, em relação às abordagens propostas anteriormente. Além disso, liberamos os dados de comportamento do olhar coletados junto com nosso código e modelos multilíngues.', 'fr': "La détection automatique des apparentés facilite les tâches de PNL en aval de traduction automatique, de récupération d'informations multilingues, de phylogénétique computationnelle et de reconnaissance d'entités nommées multilingues. Les approches précédentes pour la tâche de détection apparentée utilisent des ensembles de caractéristiques basés sur la similitude orthographique, phonétique et sémantique. Dans cet article, nous proposons une nouvelle méthode pour enrichir les ensembles de fonctionnalités, avec des caractéristiques cognitives extraites du comportement du regard des lecteurs humains. Nous collectons des données sur le comportement du regard pour un petit échantillon de produits apparentés et montrons que les caractéristiques cognitives extraites aident à la tâche de détection des objets apparentés. Cependant, la collecte et l'annotation de données de regard sont une tâche coûteuse. Nous utilisons les données collectées sur le comportement du regard pour prédire les caractéristiques cognitives d'un échantillon plus large et montrer que les caractéristiques cognitives prédites améliorent également de manière significative la performance des tâches. Nous rapportons des améliorations de 10\xa0% avec les caractéristiques de regard collectées, et de 12\xa0% avec les caractéristiques de regard prédites, par rapport aux approches proposées précédemment. En outre, nous publions les données collectées sur le comportement du regard ainsi que notre code et nos modèles multilingues.", 'ja': 'コグネイトの自動検出は、機械翻訳、クロスリンガル情報検索、計算系統発生学、およびクロスリンガル命名エンティティ認識の下流NLPタスクを支援します。 コグネイト検出のタスクのための以前のアプローチは、オルソグラフィー、音声学、および意味論的類似性に基づく特徴セットを使用します。 本稿では，人間の読者の視線行動から抽出された認知的特徴を用いて，特徴セットを豊かにするための斬新な方法を提案する． 私たちは、少量のコグネイトサンプルの視線行動データを収集し、抽出された認知特徴がコグネイト検出のタスクを助けることを示します。 しかし、視線データの収集と注釈付けはコストのかかる作業です。 私たちは、収集された視線行動データを使用して、より大きなサンプルの認知機能を予測し、予測された認知機能もまた、タスクのパフォーマンスを大幅に向上させることを示します。 以前に提案されたアプローチよりも、収集された視線機能で10 ％、予測された視線機能を使用して12 ％改善したと報告しています。 さらに、収集された視線行動データをコードとクロスリンガルモデルとともにリリースします。', 'hi': 'कॉग्नेट्स का स्वचालित पता लगाने से मशीन अनुवाद, क्रॉस-लिंगुअल सूचना पुनर्प्राप्ति, कम्प्यूटेशनल फाइलोजेनेटिक्स और क्रॉस-लिंगुअल नामित एंटिटी रिकग्निशन के डाउनस्ट्रीम एनएलपी कार्यों में मदद मिलती है। संज्ञानात्मक पहचान के कार्य के लिए पिछले दृष्टिकोण ऑर्थोग्राफिक, ध्वन्यात्मक और शब्दार्थ समानता आधारित सुविधाओं सेट का उपयोग करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम मानव पाठकों के टकटकी व्यवहार से निकाली गई संज्ञानात्मक विशेषताओं के साथ, फीचर सेट को समृद्ध करने के लिए एक उपन्यास विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम कॉग्नेट के एक छोटे से नमूने के लिए टकटकी व्यवहार डेटा एकत्र करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि निकाली गई संज्ञानात्मक विशेषताएं संज्ञानात्मक पहचान के कार्य में मदद करती हैं। हालांकि, टकटकी डेटा संग्रह और एनोटेशन एक महंगा काम है। हम एक बड़े नमूने के लिए संज्ञानात्मक सुविधाओं की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए एकत्र टकटकी व्यवहार डेटा का उपयोग करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि संज्ञानात्मक विशेषताओं की भविष्यवाणी की गई है, साथ ही, कार्य प्रदर्शन में काफी सुधार होता है। हम एकत्र टकटकी सुविधाओं के साथ 10% के सुधार की रिपोर्ट करते हैं, और 12% पहले से प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोणों पर अनुमानित टकटकी सुविधाओं का उपयोग करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम अपने कोड और क्रॉस-लिंगुअल मॉडल के साथ एकत्र किए गए टकटकी व्यवहार डेटा को जारी करते हैं।', 'zh': '自动检测同源词有助于下流之NLP,若机器翻译、跨言信息检索、计统发育、跨语名实体识之。 旧用同源检测之法用基于正交,语音语义相似性之特徵。 于本文中,我们发出一种特征的新法术,从人们读者的注视行为中提取认识特征。 收拾一小同源物样本凝视行数,并明提取识特征有助于同源物检测之任。 然凝视数据收注是一项代价高昂的任务。 吾以聚行数占大样本之知,而明知亦显绩效。 臣等上言,比之前法,收注有10%改进,用占改进率为12%。 又发所注行数及代码、言语模样。', 'ru': 'Автоматическое обнаружение когнатов помогает нижестоящим задачам NLP машинного перевода, межъязыкового поиска информации, вычислительной филогенетики и межъязыкового распознавания именованных сущностей. Предыдущие подходы к задаче когнатного обнаружения используют орфографические, фонетические и семантические наборы признаков на основе сходства. В данной работе мы предлагаем новый метод обогащения наборов признаков когнитивными признаками, извлеченными из поведения читателей. Мы собираем данные о поведении взгляда для небольшой выборки когнатов и показываем, что извлеченные когнитивные признаки помогают в задаче обнаружения когнатов. Вместе с тем сбор данных и аннотированных данных является дорогостоящей задачей. Мы используем собранные данные о поведении взгляда для прогнозирования когнитивных особенностей для большей выборки и показываем, что прогнозируемые когнитивные особенности также значительно улучшают выполнение задачи. Мы сообщаем об улучшении на 10% с собранными характеристиками взгляда и на 12% с использованием прогнозируемых характеристик взгляда по сравнению с ранее предложенными подходами. Кроме того, мы публикуем собранные данные о поведении взгляда вместе с нашим кодом и кросс-лингвистическими моделями.', 'ga': 'Cuidíonn braite uathoibríoch gaolmhaire le tascanna NLP iartheachtacha a bhaineann le hAistriúchán Meaisín, Aisghabháil Faisnéise Trastheangacha, Phylogenetics Ríomhaireachtúil agus Aitheantas Aonán Ainmnithe Trastheangach. Úsáideann cuir chuige roimhe seo don tasc a bhaineann le braite gaolmhar tacair gnéithe bunaithe ar chosúlacht ortagrafach, foghraíochta agus shéimeantach. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid modh úrnua chun na tacair ghnéis a shaibhriú, le gnéithe cognaíocha a bhaintear as iompar súl léitheoirí daonna. Bailímid sonraí iompraíochta gaze le haghaidh sampla beag gaolmhar agus taispeánann muid go gcabhraíonn gnéithe cognaíocha a bhaintear as an tasc a bhaineann le braiteadh gaolmhar. Mar sin féin, is tasc costasach é bailiú sonraí gaze agus anótáil. Bainimid úsáid as na sonraí iompraíochta gaze a bailíodh chun gnéithe cognaíocha a thuar le haghaidh sampla níos mó agus a thaispeáint go bhfuil gnéithe cognaíocha tuartha, freisin, feabhas suntasach ar fheidhmíocht tasc. Tuairiscímid feabhsuithe 10% leis na gnéithe gaze bailithe, agus 12% ag baint úsáide as na gnéithe gaze tuartha, thar na cuir chuige a moladh roimhe seo. Ina theannta sin, eiseoimid na sonraí iompraíochta gaze bailithe mar aon lenár gcód agus samhlacha tras-teangacha.', 'hu': 'A kognátok automatikus felismerése segíti a gépi fordítás, a többnyelvű információvisszakeresés, a számítástechnikai filogenetika és a többnyelvű nevezett entitás felismerés további folyamatait. Korábbi megközelítések a kognált detektálás feladatához ortográfiai, fonetikai és szemantikai hasonlóság alapú jellemzőkészleteket használnak. Jelen tanulmányban egy új módszert javasolunk a funkciókészletek gazdagítására, az emberi olvasók tekintetéből kivont kognitív tulajdonságokkal. Tekintési viselkedési adatokat gyűjtünk egy kis mintához, és megmutatjuk, hogy a kivont kognitív tulajdonságok segítenek a kognitív felismerés feladatában. A tekintési adatok gyűjtése és jegyzetelése azonban költséges feladat. Az összegyűjtött tekintet viselkedési adatokat arra használjuk fel, hogy egy nagyobb minta kognitív jellemzőit megjósoljuk, és megmutassuk, hogy az előrejelzett kognitív jellemzők is jelentősen javítják a feladatteljesítményt. A korábban javasolt megközelítésekhez képest 10%-os javulást jelentünk az összegyűjtött tekintési jellemzőkkel, 12%-os javulást pedig a várt tekintési jellemzőkkel. Továbbá az összegyűjtött tekintet viselkedési adatokat kódunkkal és nyelveken átnyúló modelleinkkel együtt kiadjuk.', 'el': 'Η αυτόματη ανίχνευση γνωστικών στοιχείων βοηθά τα επόμενα καθήκοντα της μηχανικής μετάφρασης, της ανάκτησης γλωσσών πληροφοριών, της υπολογιστικής φυτογενετικής και της αναγνώρισης γλωσσικών ονομαστικών οντοτήτων. Οι προηγούμενες προσεγγίσεις για το έργο της ανίχνευσης συγγενών χρησιμοποιούν σύνολα χαρακτηριστικών ορθογραφικών, φωνητικών και σημασιολογικών ομοιοτήτων. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια νέα μέθοδο εμπλουτισμού των συνόλων χαρακτηριστικών, με γνωστικά χαρακτηριστικά που εξάγονται από τη συμπεριφορά του ανθρώπινου αναγνώστη. Συλλέγουμε δεδομένα συμπεριφοράς ματιού για ένα μικρό δείγμα γνωστών και δείχνουμε ότι τα εκχυλισμένα γνωστικά χαρακτηριστικά βοηθούν στο έργο της ανίχνευσης γνωστών. Ωστόσο, η συλλογή δεδομένων βλέμματος και η σχολιασμός είναι ένα δαπανηρό έργο. Χρησιμοποιούμε τα δεδομένα συμπεριφοράς ματιού για να προβλέψουμε γνωστικά χαρακτηριστικά για ένα μεγαλύτερο δείγμα και να δείξουμε ότι τα προβλεπόμενα γνωστικά χαρακτηριστικά βελτιώνουν σημαντικά την απόδοση της εργασίας. Αναφέρουμε βελτιώσεις 10% με τα συλλεγόμενα χαρακτηριστικά ματιού και 12% χρησιμοποιώντας τα προβλεπόμενα χαρακτηριστικά ματιού, σε σχέση με τις προηγούμενες προτεινόμενες προσεγγίσεις. Επιπλέον, απελευθερώνουμε τα συλλεγμένα δεδομένα συμπεριφοράς ματιού μαζί με τον κώδικα και τα γλωσσικά μοντέλα μας.', 'ka': 'Name კონონიტური განსახულების მოსახულების წინასწარმოდგენება ორტოგრაფიკური, ფონიტიკური და სმენტიკური განსახულების განსახულების შესახებ. ჩვენ ამ წიგნაში პრომენტიური მეტი, რომელიც ფუნქციების ნაწილიდან კონციგური ფუნქციები გამოყენებულია. ჩვენ მონაცემების მონაცემები კონდონეტების პატარა ნაგულისხმებისთვის დაყენებთ და გამოჩვენებთ, რომ კონდონტიგური მონაცემები კონგენტიგური მონაცემე მაგრამ მონაცემების კოლექცია და ამოცემები უფრო ძალიან დასაწყება. ჩვენ გამოყენებთ კონფიგური მონაცემების მონაცემები, რომელიც უფრო დიდ მონაცემებისთვის კონფიგური მონაცემებისთვის და ჩვენ გამოყენებთ, რომ კონფიგური მონაცემები ჩვენ აღწერეთ 10%-ის უფრო მეტადება, რომელიც კოლექტირებულია მონაცემებით, და 12%-ის გამოყენებაში, რომელიც წინასწინასწინასწინასწინასწორებული მონაცემე დამატებით, ჩვენ ჩვენი კოლექტირებული მონაცემების მონაცემების გახსნა, რომელიც ჩვენი კოდის და მრავალენგური მოდელებით.', 'it': "Il rilevamento automatico dei cognati aiuta le attività NLP a valle di Machine Translation, Cross-lingual Information Retrieval, Computational Phylogenetics e Cross-lingual Named Entity Recognition. Gli approcci precedenti per il compito di rilevazione cognitiva utilizzano set di caratteristiche ortografiche, fonetiche e semantiche basate sulla somiglianza. In questo articolo proponiamo un nuovo metodo per arricchire i set di funzionalità, con caratteristiche cognitive estratte dal comportamento dello sguardo dei lettori umani. Raccogliamo dati sul comportamento dello sguardo per un piccolo campione di cognati e mostriamo che le caratteristiche cognitive estratte aiutano il compito di rilevazione cognitiva. Tuttavia, la raccolta e l'annotazione dei dati di sguardo è un compito costoso. Utilizziamo i dati raccolti sul comportamento dello sguardo per prevedere le caratteristiche cognitive di un campione più ampio e mostrare che le caratteristiche cognitive previste, inoltre, migliorano significativamente le prestazioni del compito. Riportiamo miglioramenti del 10% con le caratteristiche dello sguardo raccolte, e del 12% utilizzando le caratteristiche dello sguardo previste, rispetto agli approcci precedentemente proposti. Inoltre, rilasciamo i dati raccolti sul comportamento dello sguardo insieme al nostro codice e modelli multilingui.", 'kk': 'Конайттарды автоматты түрде анықтау машина аудару, көп тілді мәліметті алу, компьютерлік филогенетика және көп тілді аталған нысандарды анықтауға көмектеседі. Беймәлім анықтау тапсырмасының алдыңғы арқылы ортографикалық, фонетикалық және семантикалық ұқсас параметрлері қолданылады. Бұл қағазда, адамдар оқушыларының қарау әрекеттерінен көбейту әдістерін қолдануға романдық әдістерін қолданамыз. Біз белгілер үшін кішкентай үлгілер үшін бақылау деректерін жинақтап, табылған белгілі мүмкіндіктер тапсырманы анықтау тапсырмасына көмектеседі. Бірақ деректерді жинақтау мен жазбаларды қарау - бағалау тапсырмасы. Біз жинақталған бақылау тәртібін қолданып, күнделікті қасиеттерді үлкен үлкен мәліметті таңдау үшін күнделікті өзгерту үшін қолданамыз және тапсырманың жылдамдығын өте жақ Біз 10% жақсы жақсартуларды және 12% бақылау мүмкіндіктерін, бұрынғы жақсартылған жағдайларды қолдануға болады. Қосымша, біз жинақталған бақылау тәртібін код және көптеген тілдер үлгілеріміздің мәліметтерімізмен бірге шығармыз.', 'lt': 'Automatic detection of cognates helps downstream NLP tasks of Machine Translation, Cross-lingual Information Retrieval, Computational Phylogenetics and Cross-lingual Named Entity Recognition.  Ankstesni metodai, taikomi kognatų aptikimo uždaviniui, naudojami ortografiniais, fonetiniais ir semantiniais panašumo charakteristikų rinkiniais. Šiame dokumente siūlome naują būdą, kaip praturtinti savybių rinkinius, turinčius pažintines savybes, gautas iš žmogaus skaitytojų žvilgsnio elgesio. Surinkame pažiūrėjimo elgsenos duomenis mažam kognatų mėginiui ir rodome, kad išgautos pažiūrėjimo savybės padeda pažiūrėti. Tačiau žvilgsnio duomenų rinkimas ir anotacija yra brangi užduotis. Mes naudojame surinktus žvilgsnio elgesio duomenis, kad būtų galima prognozuoti pažintines savybes didesniam mėginiui ir parodyti, kad prognozuojamos pažintinės savybės taip pat gerokai pagerina užduočių rezultatus. Apie anksčiau siūlomus metodus pranešame apie 10 proc. pagerėjimus, susijusius su surinktais žvilgsnio požymiais, o 12 proc. naudojant prognozuojamus žvilgsnio požymius. Be to, mes išleidžiame surinktus žvilgsnio elgesio duomenis kartu su mūsų kodu ir tarpkalbiniais modeliais.', 'ml': 'കോഗ്നേറ്റുകളുടെ സ്വയം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ, ക്രോസ്- ലാങ്കുകളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വീണ്ടെടുക്കുന്നത്, കണക്കാക്കുന്ന ഫൈലോജനറ്റിക്സും ക് Previous approaches for the task of cognate detection use orthographic, phonetic and semantic similarity based features sets.  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നത് മനുഷ്യരുടെ കണ്ണുകളില്\u200d നിന്ന് വായിക്കുന്നവരുടെ സ്വഭാവം ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക് കോഗ്നേറ്റുകളുടെ ചെറിയ മാതൃകയ്ക്കായി നോക്കുന്ന സ്വഭാവങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. കോഗ്നേറ്റ് കണ്ടെത എന്നാലും ഡേറ്റാ സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുന്നതും വിചാരിക്കുന്നതും വിലയേറെ ജോലിയാണ്. കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dന്ന നോക്കുന്ന സ്വഭാവങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു വലിയ മാതൃകയ്ക്കുള്ള പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവചിക്കുന്നതിനായി  നമ്മള്\u200d പത്ത് ശതമാനത്തില്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന മുന്നറിയിപ്പ് വരുത്തുന്നു, പ്രത്യേകിച്ച നോട്ടിന്റെ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗി അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മുടെ കോഡും ക്രിസ്ലിങ്കുള്ള മോഡലുകളും കൊണ്ട് സംഘടിച്ച നോക്കുന്ന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളുടെ പ്രകൃ', 'mt': "L-individwazzjoni awtomatika tal-kononati tgħin fil-ħidmiet downstream tal-NLP tat-Traduzzjoni tal-Makkinarju, il-kisba ta’ informazzjoni translingwistika, il-Filoġenetika tal-Komputazzjoni u r-Rikonoxximent ta’ Entità Ismija Translingwistika. Approċċi preċedenti għall-kompitu tad-detezzjoni tal-kononat jużaw settijiet ta’ karatteristiċi bbażati fuq similarità ortografika, fonetika u semantika. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu metodu ġdid għall-arrikkiment tas-settijiet tal-karatteristiċi, b’karatteristiċi konjittivi estratti mill-imġiba tal-qarrejja umani. Aħna nġabru dejta dwar l-imġiba tal-għajnejn għal kampjun żgħir ta’ kononati u nuru li karatteristiċi konjittivi estratti jgħinu fil-kompitu tal-individwazzjoni tal-kononati. Madankollu, il-ġbir u l-annotazzjoni tad-dejta tal-għajnejn huma kompitu għali. Aħna nużaw id-dejta dwar l-imġiba tal-għajnejn miġbura biex nipprojbixxu l-karatteristiċi konjittivi għal kampjun akbar u nuru li l-karatteristiċi konjittivi mbassra, ukoll, itejbu b’mod sinifikanti l-prestazzjoni tal-kompitu. Aħna nirrappurtaw titjib ta' 10% bil-karatteristiċi tal-ħarsa miġbura, u 12% bl-użu tal-karatteristiċi tal-ħarsa mbassra, fuq l-approċċi proposti qabel. Barra minn hekk, nirrilaxxaw id-dejta miġbura dwar l-imġiba tal-għajnejn flimkien mal-kodiċi u l-mudelli translingwi tagħna.", 'mk': 'Автоматското детектирање на когнатите помага во понатамошните задачи на НЛП за машинска транслекција, преземање на меѓујазични информации, компutaционална филогенетика и меѓујазичко препознавање на ентитетите со име. Претходните пристапи за задачата за детекција на когнати користат ортографски, фонетски и семантични параметри базирани на сличност. Во овој весник предложуваме нов метод за богатство на сетите на карактеристики, со когнитивни карактеристики извадени од погледот на човечките читатели. Земаме податоци за однесувањето на погледот за мал примерок на когнати и покажуваме дека екстрактираните когнитивни карактеристики помагаат во задачата на детекција на когнатите. However, gaze data collection and annotation is a costly task.  Ние ги користиме собраните податоци за однесување на погледот за да предвидеме когнитивни карактеристики за поголем примерок и покажуваме дека предвидените когнитивни карактеристики, исто така, значително ја подобруваат извршноста на задачата. Ние известуваме подобрувања од 10 отсто со собраните погледни карактеристики и 12 отсто користејќи ги предвидените погледни карактеристики, во однос на претходно предложените пристапи. Покрај тоа, ги објавуваме собраните податоци за однесување на погледот заедно со нашиот код и меѓујазични модели.', 'ms': 'Pengesanan automatik kognat membantu tugas NLP turun dari Penerjemahan Mesin, Penerimaan Maklumat Selata-Bahasa, Filogenetik Komputasi dan Pengenalan Entiti bernama Selata-Bahasa. Previous approaches for the task of cognate detection use orthographic, phonetic and semantic similarity based features sets.  Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan kaedah baru untuk memperkaya set ciri-ciri, dengan ciri-ciri kognitif yang dikeluarkan dari perilaku pembaca manusia. Kami mengumpulkan data perilaku pandangan untuk sampel kecil kognat dan menunjukkan bahawa ciri-ciri kognitif ekstrak membantu tugas pengesan kognat. Namun, koleksi dan anotasi data pandangan adalah tugas yang mahal. Kami menggunakan data perilaku pandangan yang dikumpulkan untuk meramalkan ciri-ciri kognitif untuk sampel yang lebih besar dan menunjukkan bahawa ciri-ciri kognitif meramalkan, juga, meningkatkan secara signifikan prestasi tugas. Kami melaporkan peningkatan 10% dengan ciri-ciri pandangan yang dikumpulkan, dan 12% menggunakan ciri-ciri pandangan yang dijangka, atas pendekatan yang dilaporkan sebelumnya. Selain itu, kami melepaskan data perilaku pandangan yang dikumpulkan bersama dengan kod dan model saling bahasa kami.', 'no': 'Automatisk oppdaging av kognittar hjelper å nedtrekke NLP- oppgåver av maskineomsetjing, krysspråk- informasjonshenting, datamaskinen filogenetikk og krysspråk- navn oppgåver. Førre tilnærmingar for oppgåva for kogningsoppdaging bruk ortografiske, fonetiske og semantiske funksjonar basert på liknande funksjonar. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein roman metode for å rykke funksjonssettet, med kognitiv funksjonar utpakka frå oppførsel av menneskelseslesarar. Vi samler oppførseldatar for eit lite prøve av kognittar og viser at ekstraherte kognitiv funksjonar hjelper oppgåva for å kjenne oppdaging. Dette er imidlertid eit kostnadsoppgåve for datasamling og merking. Vi bruker dataene for samlinga av oppførsel for å foregå kognitiv funksjonar for ein større prøve og viser at foregåande kognitiv funksjonar også betydelig forbedrar oppgåva. Vi rapporterer forbetringar av 10% med samlingsfunksjonane, og 12% med foregåande utsjånadsfunksjonar over dei førre foregåande tilnærmingane. I tillegg løyser vi dei samlinga oppførseldane sammen med våre kode og krysspråk modeller.', 'mn': 'Конайтуудын автоматически нээлт нь машины хөгжүүлэлт, Cross-lingual Information Retrieval, Computational Phylogenetics and Cross-lingual Named Entity Recognition үүднээс бага зэрэг NLP tasks of Machine Translation, Cross-lingual Information Retrieval, Computational Phylogenetics and Cross-Language Recognition. Хүний мэдэх байдлын ажлын өмнөх арга зам нь ортографик, фоннетик, семантик төстэй төстэй харилцаа ашигладаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хүмүүсийн уншигчийн харааны үйл ажиллагаанаас нэмэгдсэн мэдлэгтэй хүмүүсийг багасгах шинэ арга зам зааж байна. Бид мэдээллийн жижиг жижиг жишээн хэлбэрээр харах үйл ажиллагааны мэдээллийг цуглуулж, мэдээллийн мэдээллийн чанар мэдээллийн ажилд тусалдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Гэхдээ мэдээллийн цуглуулалт, анзаарал бол үнэтэй ажил. Бид цуглуулсан харааны үйл ажиллагааны мэдээллийг ашиглаж том жишээ дээр мэдээллийг тодорхойлох боломжтой. Мөн мэдээллийн үйл ажиллагааны үйл ажиллагааг маш чухал сайжруулах боломжтой. Бид цуглуулсан харах чадвартай 10%-ын сайжруулалтыг харуулж байна. 12% нь өмнө санал болсон арга барилгуудын тухай таамагласан харах чадварыг ашиглаж байна. Мөн бид цуглуулсан харааны үйл ажиллагааны мэдээллийг бидний код болон олон хэл загвартай хамт гаргадаг.', 'pl': 'Automatyczne wykrywanie poznań pomaga w dalszych zadaniach NLP w zakresie tłumaczenia maszynowego, odzyskiwania informacji między językami, obliczeniowej filogenetyki i rozpoznawania między językami nazwanymi. Poprzednie podejścia do zadania wykrywania pokrewnych wykorzystują zestawy cech ortograficznych, fonetycznych i semantycznych opartych na podobieństwie. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nowatorską metodę wzbogacania zestawów funkcji o cechy poznawcze ekstraktowane z zachowania spojrzenia czytelników. Gromadzimy dane dotyczące zachowania spojrzenia dla małej próbki poznań i pokazujemy, że ekstrahowane cechy poznawcze pomagają w wykrywaniu poznań. Jednak gromadzenie i adnotacja danych dotyczących spojrzenia jest kosztownym zadaniem. Wykorzystujemy zebrane dane dotyczące zachowania spojrzenia do przewidywania cech poznawczych dla większej próbki i pokazania, że przewidywane cechy poznawcze również znacząco poprawiają wydajność zadania. Raportujemy ulepszenia 10% z zebranymi cechami spojrzenia, a 12% z wykorzystaniem przewidywanych cech spojrzenia, w porównaniu z proponowanymi wcześniej metodami. Ponadto udostępniamy zebrane dane dotyczące zachowania spojrzenia wraz z naszym kodem i modelami wielojęzycznymi.', 'sr': 'Automatski otkrivanje kogniata pomaže da smanjuje zadatke NLP za prevod mašine, prikupljanje preko jezika informacija, kompjutersku filogenetiku i prepoznavanje preko jezika imenovanih entiteta. Prethodni pristupi zadatku kognitivne detekcije koriste ortografske, fonetičke i semantičke opcije na temelju sličnosti. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu metodu za bogatstvo seta karakteristika, sa kognitivnim karakteristikama izvučenim iz ponašanja ljudskih čitača. Skupljamo podatke o ponašanju pogleda za mali uzorak kogniteta i pokazujemo da izvlačene kognitivne karakteristike pomažu zadatku kognitivnog otkrića. Međutim, kolekcija podataka i annotacija su skup zadatak. Koristimo podatke o skupljenim ponašanju pogleda kako bi predvidjeli kognitivne karakteristike za veći uzorak i pokazali da predviđene kognitivne karakteristike takođe značajno poboljšavaju izvršnost zadataka. Prijavljujemo poboljšanja od 10% sa skupljenim karakteristikama pogleda, a 12% koristeći predviđene karakteristike pogleda, preko prethodnih predloženih pristupa. Osim toga, otpuštamo podatke o skupljenom ponašanju pogleda zajedno sa našim kodom i preko jezika.', 'ro': 'Detectarea automată a cunoștințelor ajută la activitățile din aval ale PNL de traducere automată, recuperare a informațiilor între limbi, filogenetică computațională și recunoaștere a entităților denumite între limbi. Abordările anterioare pentru sarcina detectării cognitive utilizează seturi de caracteristici ortografice, fonetice și semantice bazate pe similitudine. În această lucrare, propunem o metodă nouă de îmbogățire a seturilor de caracteristici, cu caracteristici cognitive extrase din comportamentul privirii cititorilor umani. Colectăm date privind comportamentul privirii pentru o mică mostră de cunoștințe și arătăm că caracteristicile cognitive extrase ajută la detectarea cunoștințelor. Cu toate acestea, colectarea și adnotarea datelor privind privirea sunt o sarcină costisitoare. Folosim datele colectate privind comportamentul privirii pentru a prezice caracteristicile cognitive pentru un eșantion mai mare și pentru a arăta că caracteristicile cognitive preconizate, de asemenea, îmbunătățesc semnificativ performanța sarcinii. Raportăm îmbunătățiri de 10% cu caracteristicile privirii colectate și 12% cu caracteristicile privirii anticipate, față de abordările propuse anterior. Mai mult decât atât, eliberăm datele colectate privind comportamentul privirii împreună cu codul și modelele noastre translingvistice.', 'so': 'Shaqooyinka Maamulka (NLP), Turjumidda macluumaadka ee Cross-luqada, Retrieval of Fiylogenetics (Computational Phylogenetics) iyo Aqoonsiga Iswidish-Luqada lagu magacaabay Previous approaches for the task of cognate detection use orthographic, phonetic and semantic similarity based features sets.  Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab warqad ah oo ku hodanayno koonfureedyada, oo ay leeyihiin aqoonta dabeecada aragtida dadka akhriya. Waxaynu soo ururiyaa macluumaadka dabeecada aragtida tusaale yar oo isbitaal ah, waxaana muujinnaa in alaabta la soo saaray ay ka caawinayaan shaqo la soo ogaado shahaadada. Si kastaba ha ahaatee heshiiska macluumaadku waa shaqo qaali ah. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa macluumaadka dabeecada ee la soo ururiyey si aan u sii sheegno tusaale ka weyn, waxaana muujinnaa in loo horumariyey aqoonta, sidoo kale si muhiim ah loo beddelo sameynta shaqada. Waxaannu soo sheegaynaa horumarinta 10 boqolkiiba, waxayna leedahay noocyada la soo ururiyey, waxayna isticmaalayaan 12 boqolkiiba oo isticmaalaya noocyada la hor maro. Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaynu u sii daynaa macluumaadka dabeecada aragyada la soo ururiyey oo ku qoran qaababkayaga iyo qaababka luuqadaha kala duwan.', 'si': 'Name පරීක්ෂණය හොයාගන්න වැඩකට පසුගිය ප්\u200dරවේශනය, ෆෝනෙටික් සහ සෙමාන්ටික් සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂතාවක් අධික විශ මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා, මිනිස්සු කියවන්නේ බලාපොරොත්තු වර්තනයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා. අපි බලන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාර දත්ත සම්පූර්ණයේ පොඩි සැමැල්ලක් වෙනුවෙන් සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විශ නමුත්, බලන්න දත්ත සංගීතය සහ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ගොඩක් වැඩක්. අපි සම්පූර්ණයෙන් බලාපොරොත්තුවේ දත්ත පාවිච්චි කරනවා ලොකු සැමැල්ලක් සඳහා පරීක්ෂණ විශේෂ අවස්ථාවක් සැකසුම අපි 10% විශේෂතාව සම්බන්ධ විශේෂතාවක් සමග, 12% විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා, පස්සේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරලා ති තවත්, අපි සම්පූර්ණ බලන්න පුළුවන් දේවල් අපේ කෝඩ් එක්ක සහ ක්\u200dරිස් භාෂාවක් මොඩේල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරතික', 'ta': 'Name கோக்னேட் கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான முந்தைய முன்னேற்றங்கள் முன்னோக்கியம், போன்டிக் மற்றும் ஒத்திசைப்படையான தன்மைகள இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய முறைமையை செருகுவதற்கு, மனித படிப்பாளர்களின் பார்வை நடத்தையிலிருந்து வெளியேற்றும் குண நாம் ஒரு சிறிய குறியீடுகளுக்கு பார்வை நடத்தை தகவல்களை சேகரிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் குறியீடுகளின் குறியீட்டு அறிவிப்பு கு ஆயினும், தரவு தொகுப்பு மற்றும் அறிவிப்பு செலவு செய்யும். நாம் சேகரிக்கப்பட்ட பார்வை நடத்தை தகவலை பயன்படுத்தி பெரிய மாதிரிக்கும் குணங்களை முன்வெளிப்படுத்துவதற்கு மற்றும் முன்வாக்கப்பட்ட குணங நாங்கள் 10% முன்னேற்றத்தை அறிவிக்கிறோம், சேகரிக்கப்பட்ட பார்வை குணங்கள் மற்றும் 12% முன்னோர்க்கப்பட்ட முன்னோர்க்கப்பட் அதற்கு மேலும், நாம் சேகரிக்கப்பட்ட பார்வை நடத்தை தகவலை வெளியிடுகிறோம் எங்கள் குறியீடு மற்றும் மொழி மொழிகள', 'sv': 'Automatisk upptäckt av kognitioner hjälper nedströms NLP uppgifter för maskinöversättning, korspråkig informationshämtning, beräkningsfylogenetik och korspråkig namngiven entitetsigenkänning. Tidigare tillvägagångssätt för uppgiften kognitiv detektering använder ortografiska, fonetiska och semantiska likhetsbaserade funktioner. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en ny metod för att berika funktionsuppsättningarna, med kognitiva funktioner som utvinns från människors läsares blickbeteende. Vi samlar in blickbeteendedata för ett litet urval av kognitiva egenskaper och visar att extraherade kognitiva funktioner hjälper till att upptäcka kognitiva egenskaper. Insamling och notering av blickdata är dock en kostsam uppgift. Vi använder insamlade blickbeteendedata för att förutsäga kognitiva funktioner för ett större urval och visa att förutspådda kognitiva funktioner också avsevärt förbättrar uppgiftens prestanda. Vi rapporterar förbättringar på 10% med de insamlade blickdragen, och 12% med de förutspådda blickdragen, jämfört med tidigare föreslagna tillvägagångssätten. Dessutom släpper vi insamlade blickbeteendedata tillsammans med vår kod och korspråkiga modeller.', 'ur': 'Name پہچان شناسایی کے کام کے لئے پہلے طریقے ہیں اورٹوگرافیک، فونیک اور سیمانٹی شبیه طریقے کے متعلق فرضیوں کے ساتھ استعمال کرتے ہیں. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک نو طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ انسان کے پڑھنے والوں کی نگاہ رفتار سے نکالے جاتے ہیں۔ ہم ایک چھوٹی نمونہ کے لئے نگاہ کی رفتاری ڈیٹے جمع کرتے ہیں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ اٹھائے جاتے ہیں شناختہ شناخت کے کام کی مدد کرتے ہیں. اگرچہ، ڈیٹا جمع کرنا اور انٹیٹ کو دیکھنا بہت بڑا کام ہے۔ ہم نے ایک بڑے نمونے کے لئے پہچان لینے کے لئے محشور کی نگاہ رفتاری ڈاٹی کا استعمال کرتا ہے اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ پہچان لینے والی فرصت بھی، اور تابع کامیابی کو اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ ہم جمع ہوئے نگاہ فرصت کے ساتھ 10% کی سوداگریاں گزارتے ہیں، اور 12% کی پیش آئی نگاہ فرصت کے مطابق، پہلے سے پیش آئی ہوئی طریقے پر۔ اس کے علاوہ ہم جمع کئے ہوئے نگاہ کے رفتار کے ساتھ ہمارے کڈ اور کئی زبان مدل کے ساتھ آزاد کرتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Name Bu hujjatda, biz inson o'quvchilarining xususiyatlaridan tasavvur qiladigan qoʻllanmalarni yordam usulini yordam qilishni anglatamiz. We collect gaze behaviour data for a small sample of cognates and show that extracted cognitive features help the task of cognate detection.  Lekin, maʼlumot toʻplami va taxminan tashkilotga qarang. Biz bir katta samol uchun qo'llangan xususiyatlarni ko'rib chiqarish uchun qo'llangan xususiyatlarni foydalanamiz va ishni bajarish imkoniyatini juda ham yaxshi ko'rsatdik. Biz oldingi talab qilingan murakkab ko'rining xususiyatlari bilan 10% uzoqlarini hisoblash mumkin, va 12% ishlatilgan ko'zning xususiyatlarini ishlatish mumkin. Kodlash va har bir necha tilning modellari bilan bir necha qoidagi xususiyatlarni chiqaramiz.", 'vi': 'Việc phát hiện răng nanh tự động giúp việc lập trình ngôn ngữ nằm dưới của Machine Translation, Cross-ngôn-lingal Information Retrievel, tính toán Phylogenetics and Cross-ngôn ngữ Tênd Entity recognition. Những phương pháp trước cho nhiệm vụ phát hiện răng nanh sử dụng các thiết lập cấu trúc cơ bản, ngữ âm và theo ngữ nghĩa giống nhau. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp mới để làm giàu các bộ phim, với những tính năng nhận thức lấy ra từ hành vi nhìn của người đọc. Chúng tôi thu thập dữ liệu hành vi ánh nhìn cho một mẫu bánh răng nhỏ và cho thấy những tính năng nhận thức được chiết xuất giúp việc khám phá răng. Tuy nhiên, thu thập dữ liệu và chú thích là một nhiệm vụ tốn kém. Chúng tôi sử dụng dữ liệu hành vi ánh nhìn thu thập để dự đoán các tính năng nhận thức cho mẫu lớn hơn và cho thấy các tính năng nhận thức được dự đoán cũng cải thiện đáng kể khả năng làm việc. Chúng tôi báo cáo sự cải tiến của 10. với những nét nhìn thu thập, và 12. trên những nét nhìn được dự đoán, trên các phương pháp đã đề xuất trước. Chúng tôi công bố dữ liệu hành vi quan sát thu thập cùng với mã và các mẫu ngôn ngữ khác nhau.', 'bg': 'Автоматичното откриване на конгати помага за задачите надолу по веригата на машинен превод, междуезично извличане на информация, изчислителна филогенетика и междуезично разпознаване на имена на субекти. Предишните подходи за задачата за разпознаване на познати използват ортографски, фонетични и семантични сходства. В настоящата статия предлагаме нов метод за обогатяване на наборите функции, с когнитивни характеристики, извлечени от поведението на човешкия читател. Събираме данни за поведението на погледа за малка извадка от конгати и показваме, че извлечените когнитивни характеристики помагат на задачата за откриване на конгати. Събирането на данни и анотацията на поглед обаче е скъпа задача. Използваме събраните данни за поведението на погледа, за да прогнозираме когнитивните характеристики за по-голяма извадка и да покажем, че прогнозираните когнитивни характеристики също значително подобряват изпълнението на задачата. Докладваме подобрения от 10% при събраните черти на погледа и 12% при прогнозираните черти на погледа спрямо предложените по-рано подходи. Освен това, ние публикуваме събраните данни за поведението на погледа заедно с нашия код и междуезични модели.', 'da': 'Automatisk detektion af kognitioner hjælper nedstrøms NLP-opgaver inden for maskinoversættelse, tværsproget informationshentning, beregningsflyogenetik og tværsproget navngivet enhedsgenkendelse. Tidligere tilgange til opgaven med kognitiv detektion bruger ortografiske, fonetiske og semantiske lighedsbaserede funktioner sæt. I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny metode til berigelse af funktionssættene med kognitive træk udvundet fra menneskelige læseres blikadfærd. Vi indsamler data om øjneadfærd for en lille prøve af kognitive egenskaber og viser, at ekstraherede kognitive egenskaber hjælper opgaven med kognitive detektion. Indsamling og notering af blikdata er dog en dyr opgave. Vi bruger de indsamlede data til at forudsige kognitive egenskaber for en større prøve og vise, at forudsigede kognitive egenskaber også forbedrer opgavens ydeevne betydeligt. Vi rapporterer forbedringer på 10% med de indsamlede blikfunktioner og 12% ved hjælp af de forventede blikfunktioner i forhold til de tidligere foreslåede tilgange. Desuden frigiver vi de indsamlede data om synsadfærd sammen med vores kode og tværsprogede modeller.', 'nl': 'Automatische detectie van cognities helpt downstream NLP taken van Machine Translation, Cross-lingual Information Retrieval, Computational Phylogenetics en Cross-lingual Named Entity Recognition. Eerdere benaderingen voor de taak van cognate detectie maken gebruik van orthografische, fonetische en semantische gelijkenis gebaseerde eigenschappen sets. In dit artikel stellen we een nieuwe methode voor om de feature sets te verrijken, met cognitieve kenmerken die worden geëxtraheerd uit het gezichtsgedrag van menselijke lezers. We verzamelen gegevens over het kijkgedrag voor een klein monster van cognaten en laten zien dat geëxtraheerde cognitieve kenmerken helpen bij het detecteren van cognaten. Het verzamelen en annoteren van kijkgegevens is echter een kostbare taak. We gebruiken de verzamelde kijkgedragsgegevens om cognitieve kenmerken voor een grotere steekproef te voorspellen en aan te tonen dat voorspelde cognitieve kenmerken ook de taakverprestaties aanzienlijk verbeteren. We rapporteren verbeteringen van 10% met de verzamelde kijkfuncties, en 12% met behulp van de voorspelde kijkfuncties, ten opzichte van de eerder voorgestelde benaderingen. Daarnaast geven we de verzamelde kijkgedragsgegevens samen met onze code en meertalige modellen vrij.', 'hr': 'Automatski otkrivanje kognita pomaže u smanjenju zadataka NLP-a za prevod strojeva, prikupljanje preko jezika informacija, računalne filogenetike i prepoznavanje preko jezika imenovanih podataka. Prethodni pristupi zadatku otkrivanja upotrebe ortografijskih, fonetičkih i semantičkih karakteristika temeljnih na temelju sličnosti. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu metodu za bogatstvo seta karakteristika, s kognitivnim karakteristikama izvučenim iz ponašanja ljudskih čitača. Skupljamo podatke o ponašanju pogleda za mali uzorak kognita i pokazujemo da izvlačene kognitivne karakteristike pomažu zadatku kognitivnog otkrića. Međutim, kolekcija podataka i annotacija pogleda su skup zadatak. Koristimo podatke o skupljenim ponašanju pogleda kako bi predvidjeli kognitivne funkcije za veći uzorak i pokazali da predviđene kognitivne funkcije također značajno poboljšavaju učinkovitost zadataka. Prijavljujemo poboljšanje od 10% s prikupljenim karakteristikama pogleda, a 12% s predviđenim karakteristikama pogleda, o prethodnim predloženim pristupima. Osim toga, objavljujemo podatke o skupljenim ponašanju pogleda zajedno s našim kodom i međujezičkim modelima.', 'de': 'Die automatische Erkennung von Kognitionen unterstützt nachgelagerte NLP-Aufgaben der maschinellen Übersetzung, der sprachübergreifenden Information Retrieval, der computergestützten Phylogenetik und der sprachübergreifenden Named Entity Recognition. Bisherige Ansätze für die Aufgabe der Kognitionserkennung verwenden orthographische, phonetische und semantische Ähnlichkeitsmerkmalsätze. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine neuartige Methode vor, um die Feature Sets mit kognitiven Merkmalen zu bereichern, die aus dem Blickverhalten menschlicher Leser extrahiert werden. Wir sammeln Blickverhaltensdaten für eine kleine Stichprobe von Kognitionen und zeigen, dass extrahierte kognitive Merkmale die Aufgabe der Kognitionserkennung unterstützen. Die Erfassung und Annotation von Blickdaten ist jedoch eine kostspielige Aufgabe. Wir verwenden die gesammelten Blickverhaltensdaten, um kognitive Merkmale für eine größere Stichprobe vorherzusagen und zu zeigen, dass prognostizierte kognitive Merkmale auch die Aufgabenleistung signifikant verbessern. Wir berichten über Verbesserungen von 10% mit den gesammelten Blickmerkmalen und 12% mit den vorhergesagten Blickmerkmalen gegenüber den zuvor vorgeschlagenen Ansätzen. Darüber hinaus geben wir die gesammelten Blickverhaltensdaten zusammen mit unserem Code und unseren sprachübergreifenden Modellen frei.', 'id': 'Deteksi otomatis kognat membantu tugas NLP turun dari Translation Mesin, Penerimaan Informasi Selasa Bahasa, Filogenetik Komputasi dan Pengenalan Entitas bernama Selasa Bahasa. Pendekatan sebelumnya untuk tugas deteksi kognat gunakan set karakteristik berdasarkan ortografi, fonetik dan semantis. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan metode baru untuk memperkaya set fitur, dengan fitur kognitif yang dikeluarkan dari perilaku pandangan pembaca manusia. Kami mengumpulkan data perilaku pandangan untuk sampel kecil kognat dan menunjukkan bahwa fitur kognitif ekstraksi membantu tugas deteksi kognat. Namun, koleksi data pandangan dan anotasi adalah tugas yang mahal. Kami menggunakan data perilaku pandangan yang dikumpulkan untuk memprediksi fitur kognitif untuk sampel yang lebih besar dan menunjukkan bahwa fitur kognitif yang diprediksi, juga, meningkatkan secara signifikan prestasi tugas. Kami melaporkan peningkatan 10% dengan ciri-ciri pandangan yang dikumpulkan, dan 12% menggunakan ciri-ciri pandangan yang diprediksi, atas pendekatan yang sebelumnya diusulkan. Selain itu, kami melepaskan data perilaku pandangan yang dikumpulkan bersama dengan kode kami dan model saling bahasa.', 'sw': 'Kugundua mabango ya kujitegemea yanasaidia kazi za NLP za Tafsiri za Mashine, Kurudishwa kwa taarifa za lugha za Kisiniki, Ufilogenetics wa Hesabu na Utambulisho wa lugha ya Cross. Matokeo yaliyopita kwa ajili ya jukumu la kutambua kodi hutumia vipengele vya orthographic, simu za mkononi na semantic zilizofanana. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza njia ya riwaya ya kutajirisha seti hizo, zenye vipengele vya ujuzi zilizotolewa kutoka kwenye tabia za wasomaji binadamu. Tunakusanya taarifa za tabia za mtazamo kwa sampuli ndogo ya viungo na kuonyesha kuwa vipengele vya kitambulisho vinasaidia kugundua ujuzi. Hata hivyo, kuangalia mkusanyiko wa taarifa na kutangaza ni kazi yenye gharama. Tunatumia takwimu za tabia za macho zilizokusanyika kutabiri vipengele vya kitambulisho kwa mtihani mkubwa na kuonyesha kuwa vipengele vya kitambulisho, pia, vinaweza kuboresha kazi. Tunatoa taarifa za maendeleo ya asilimia 10 yenye vipengele vya macho vilivyokusanyika, na asilimia 12 kwa kutumia vipengele vya kutabiriwa, kwa sababu ya hatua zilizopendekezwa hapo awali. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaachia taarifa za tabia za mtazamo zilizokusanyika pamoja na sheria zetu na mifano ya lugha mbalimbali.', 'fa': 'شناسایی خودکار از شناسایی\u200cها کمک می\u200cکند که کارهای NLP از ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین، بازیابی اطلاعات متوسط زبان، پیلوژنتیک کامپیوتری و شناسایی entity نامیده شده متوسط زبان را پایین کند. دسترسی قبلی برای کار شناسایی از ویژگی\u200cهای شبیه\u200cای orthographic, phonetic and semantic استفاده می\u200cکند. در این کاغذ، ما یک روش نویسی برای توانایی مجموعه\u200cهای ویژه پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، با ویژه\u200cهای شناخته\u200cای که از رفتار نگاه\u200cکنندگان انسان خارج شده است. ما داده های رفتاری نگاه را برای نمونه کوچک از شناختن جمع می\u200cکنیم و نشان می\u200cدهیم که ویژه\u200cهای شناخته\u200cای خارج شده به کار شناختن کمک می\u200cکنند. ولی نگاه کنید جمع داده ها و اخطار یک کار ارزشمند است. ما از اطلاعات رفتاری نگاه جمع شده استفاده می کنیم تا ویژه های شناخته ای برای نمونه بزرگ پیش بینی کنیم و نشان می دهیم که ویژه های شناخته ای پیش بینی شده، همچنین، عملکرد وظیفه را بسیار بهتر کنیم. ما به بهترین ترتیب ۱۰ درصد با ویژه\u200cهای نگاه جمع شده گزارش می\u200cدهیم، و ۱۲ درصد با استفاده از ویژه\u200cهای نگاه پیش\u200cبینی، بر روی نزدیک\u200cهای پیش\u200cبینی پیشنهاد شده است. علاوه بر این، ما داده های رفتاری نگاه جمع شده را با کد و مدل های مختلف زبان آزاد می کنیم.', 'ko': '동원어의 자동 검출은 기계 번역, 다중 언어 정보 검색, 계산 시스템 발달과 다중 언어 명칭 실체 식별 등 NLP 하위 작업에 도움이 된다.이전의 동원 검출 방법은 정교, 음성과 의미의 유사성을 바탕으로 하는 특징집을 사용했다.본고에서 우리는 새로운 방법으로 특징집을 풍부하게 하고 인류 독자의 주시 행위에서 인지적 특징을 추출했다.우리는 일부 동원어의 주시 행위 데이터를 수집했고 추출된 인지적 특징이 동원어 검측에 도움이 된다는 것을 나타냈다.그러나 데이터 수집과 주석은 비용이 많이 드는 작업이다.우리는 수집된 주시 행위 데이터를 이용하여 더 큰 견본의 인지적 특징을 예측하고 예측된 인지적 특징도 임무 실적을 현저히 향상시켰다는 것을 나타낸다.우리는 이전에 제시한 방법에 비해 수집된 응시특징이 10% 개선되었고 예측된 응시특징이 12% 개선되었다고 보고했다.그 밖에 수집된 주시 행위 데이터와 우리의 코드와 크로스 언어 모델도 발표했다.', 'af': "Outomatiese opskrywing van konnekteers hulp afstrem NLP taak van Masjien Vertaling, Kruistale Informasie Ontvaring, Computational Phylogenetics en Kruistale Gegenoem Entity Recognition. Vorige toegang vir die taak van konnekteer opdaging gebruik orthografiese, fonetiese en semantiese gelykenis gebaseerde funksies. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n roman metode om die funksie stel te verryk, met kognitiewe funksies uitgevoer van menslike lesers se aangesig gedrag. Ons versamel kyk gedrag data vir 'n klein voorbeeld van konnekteers en wys dat uitgevoer kognitiewe funksies hulp die taak van konnekteer opslag. Maar kyk data versameling en notasie is 'n kosbare taak. Ons gebruik die versamele kyk gedrag data om kognitiewe funksies vir 'n groter voorbeeld te voorskou en te wys dat voorskoude kognitiewe funksies, ook, betekenlik die taak uitvoerings verbeter. Ons rapporteer verbeteringe van 10% met die versamele kyk funksies, en 12% gebruik die voorskoude kyk funksies, oor die voorheen voorgestelde toegang. Ons verlos ook die versamele kyk gedrag data saam met ons kode en kruistale modele.", 'tr': 'Otomatik tanyş edenler maşynyň terjime, geçmiş diller Maglumaty ýeterlemegine, Kalamlaryň Philogenetiki we Cross-lingual Adlany bilen kömekleýär. Tanyş tanamak üçin öňki golaýarlar Bu kagyzda, adamlaryň bakyşlaryndan çykan bilim üýtgewleri bilen täze bir roman yöntemi teklip edýäris. Bir näçe bilim namaýyna üçin seredişi maglumatlary toplaýrys we a şyrylmadyk bilim üýtgewleri tanyş görevine kömek edip bilýäris. Ýöne, maglumat koleksiyonuna we täzeliklerine seret Biz özümiz bileleşik bakış davranışlaryny uly bir örnek üçin cognitiv özellikleri öňündirmek üçin ullanýarys we şol bilen tahmin edilen bellenen tanyşlaryny hem gowy görkezmek üçin ullanýarys. Birleşik gözlemek özellikleri bilen 10% gelişmelerini we 12% öňünden öňünden teklip eden gözlemek özelliklerinden ullanýarys. Mundan başga, toplanýan gözlemek davranışlary kodymyz we çarp dil nusgalarymyz bilen seredip otyrdyk.', 'am': 'ኮኖኖኖችን ማግኘት የNLP ስራዎችን በመኪን ትርጉም፣ መስኮት-ቋንቋ መረጃ መመለስ፣ ምርጫዎች ፊልዮogenetics እና መስቀል-ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ የስሜት ዕውቀት ይረዳል። የቀድሞው የኮንጋኖት ማግኘት ስራ የኦሮግራፊክ፣ ፎንቲካዊ እና ስሜቲካዊ ምሳሌ የተደረገ የፊደል ጥያቄዎችን ተጠቀም፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የሰው አካባቢዎች የዓይን አካሄድ የተወለደውን የአንባቢ ደረጃዎችን ለማብረቅ እናስባለን፡፡ ለትንሽ ምሳሌ ጥያቄዎችን ለማሳየት እናሳየዋለን፡፡ ነገር ግን የዳታ ሰብስብ እና ማስታወቂያ የከበረ ስራ ነው፡፡ ለትልቅ ምሳሌ ለማሳየት የተሰበሰቡትን የዓይን ሁኔታ ዳታዎችን እናስቀምጣለን፣ የስራውን ማድረግ በጣም ያበዛል፡፡ We report improvements of 10% with the collected gaze features, and 12% using the predicted gaze features, over the previously proposed approaches.  ከዚህም በላይ የተሰበሰቡትን የዓይኖችን አካሄድ ዳታዎችን ከኮድ እና የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ዓይነት ጋር እናስቀራለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Կոգնատների ավտոմատ հայտնաբերումը օգնում է մեքենայի թարգմանման, լեզվի միջև տեղեկատվության վերադարձման, համակարգչային ֆիլոգետիկայի և լեզվի միջև կոչվող առանձնահատկությունների վերադարձման նպատակներին: Կոգնատի հայտնաբերման առաջին մոտեցումները օգտագործում են օրթոգրաֆիկ, ֆոնետիկ և սեմանտիկ նմանության հիմնված հատկություններ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր մեթոդ հատկանիշների հավաքածուների հարստացնելու համար, որտեղ ճանաչողական հատկանիշները դուրս են գալիս մարդկային կարդացողների աչքերի վարքագիծից: Մենք հավաքում ենք հայացքների վարքագծի տվյալներ մի փոքրիկ նմուշի համար և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ հանված ճանաչողական հատկությունները օգնում են ճանաչողական հայտնաբերման խնդիրը: Այնուամենայնիվ, նայելիս տվյալների հավաքածուն և annoտացիան թանկ խնդիր է: Մենք օգտագործում ենք հավաքված հայացքի վարքագծի տվյալները ավելի մեծ նմուշի ճանաչողական հատկությունների կանխատեսելու համար և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ կանխատեսված ճանաչողական հատկությունները նաև նշանակալի բարելավում են աշխատանքի արտադրողությունը: We report improvements of 10% with the collected gaze features, and 12% using the predicted gaze features, over the previously proposed approaches.  Ավելին, մենք հրապարակում ենք հավաքված հայացքների վարքագծի տվյալները միասին մեր կոդի և լեզվով հատված մոդելների հետ:', 'az': 'Konnatların otomatik tanıması maşın tercüməsi, çox dilli Malümatı alması, Computational Phylogenetik və çox dilli Adlı Entity Recognition işlərinə kömək edir. Bilən tanıma işləri üçün əvvəlki metodlar ortografik, fonetik və semantik simantik bənzərin qurğuları istifadə edir. Bu kağızda, insan oxuyanların gözləri davranışından çıxarılmış bilikli xüsusiyyətlər ilə fəaliyyətləri çoxlamaq üçün yeni bir yol təklif edirik. Biz küçük tanıdıqların nümunələri üçün bax davranışları toplayırıq və bildikləri tanıdıqların işinə kömək edir. Lakin, məlumatlar koleksiyonu və məlumatları dəyərli bir işdir. Biz toplanmış göz davranışları məlumatlarını daha böyük nümunə görə kognitiv xüsusiyyətləri təmin etmək üçün istifadə edirik və təmin edilmiş kognitiv xüsusiyyətləri də göstəririk. Birləşdirilmiş göz xüsusiyyətləri ilə 10%-in yaxşılıqlarını bildiririk, tədbir edilmiş göz xüsusiyyətləri ilə 12%-in əvvəlkilərin tədbir edilmiş yaxınlıqları barəsində. Daha sonra, birləşdirilmiş gözləmə davranışlarını kodumuz və çox dil modellərimizlə birlikdə yayındırırıq.', 'sq': 'Zbulimi automatik i njohësve ndihmon në përparim të detyrave të NLP-së të Trakthimit të Makinës, marrjes së informacionit ndërgjuhësor, Filogjenetikës Komputative dhe njohjes ndërgjuhësore të njësisë me emër. Përqasjet e mëparshme për detyrën e zbulimit të njohur përdorin grupe karakteristike të bazuara në ngjashmëri ortografike, fonetike dhe semantike. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një metodë të re për të pasuruar grupet e karakteristikave, me karakteristika kognitive të nxjerra nga sjellja e shikuesve njerëzor. Ne mbledhim të dhëna të sjelljes së shikimit për një mostër të vogël të njohësve dhe tregojmë se karakteristikat kognitive të nxjerra ndihmojnë detyrën e zbulimit të njohësve. Megjithatë, mbledhja e të dhënave të shikimit dhe anotacioni është një detyrë e shtrenjtë. We use the collected gaze behaviour data to predict cognitive features for a larger sample and show that predicted cognitive features, also, significantly improve the task performance.  Ne raportojmë përmirësime prej 10% me karakteristikat e mbledhura të shikimit dhe 12% duke përdorur karakteristikat e parashikuara të shikimit, mbi qasjet e propozuara më parë. Përveç kësaj, ne lëshojmë të dhënat e mbledhura të sjelljes së shikimit së bashku me kodin tonë dhe modelet ndërgjuhësore.', 'ca': "La detecció automàtica de cognats ajuda a seguir les tasques NLP de traducció màquina, recuperació d'informació translingüística, filogenètica computacional i reconeixement d'entitats anomenades translingüísticament. Els enfocaments anteriors per la tasca de detecció de cognats utilitzen conjunts de característiques basats en similitud ortogràfica, fonètica i semàntica. En aquest article proposem un mètode nou per enriquecer els conjunts de característiques, amb característiques cognitives extraïdes del comportament dels lectors humans. Recollim dades sobre el comportament de la mirada per a una petita mostra de cognats i demostrem que les característiques cognitives extraites ajuden a la tasca de la detecció de cognats. Però la col·lecció i l'anotació de dades de mirada són una tasca costosa. Utilitzem les dades de comportament de mirada recollides per predir les característiques cognitives d'una mostra més gran i demostrar que les característiques cognitives predites també milloren significativament el rendiment de la tasca. Informem millores del 10% amb les característiques de mirada recollides, i el 12% utilitzant les característiques de mirada preditides, sobre els enfocaments anteriorment proposats. A més, alliberam les dades de comportament de mirada recollides juntament amb els nostres codis i models translingües.", 'cs': 'Automatická detekce kognitů pomáhá následným NLP úkolům strojového překladu, získávání informací mezi jazyky, výpočetní fylogenetiky a rozpoznávání jmenovaných entit. Předchozí přístupy pro úlohu detekce kognitů využívají sady pravografických, fonetických a sémantických podobností založených na vlastnostech. V tomto článku navrhujeme novou metodu obohacení funkčních sad o kognitivní rysy extrahované z pohledového chování lidského čtenáře. Shromažďujeme data o chování pohledu pro malý vzorek koňátů a ukazujeme, že extrahované kognitivní funkce pomáhají detekci koňátů. Shromažďování a anotace údajů o pohledu je však nákladný úkol. Shromážděná data o chování pohledu používáme k předpovědi kognitivních funkcí pro větší vzorek a ukázání, že předpovědi kognitivních funkcí také výrazně zlepšují výkon úkolu. V porovnání s dříve navrženými přístupy uvádíme zlepšení 10% se shromážděnými funkcemi pohledu a 12% pomocí predikovaných funkcí pohledu. Kromě toho zveřejňujeme shromážděné údaje o chování pohledu spolu s našimi kódy a cross-jazyčnými modely.', 'bs': 'Automatski otkrivanje kogniata pomaže da smanjuje zadatke NLP za prevod strojeva, prikupljanje preko jezika informacija, računalne filogenetike i prepoznavanje preko jezika imenovanih entiteta. Prethodni pristupi zadatku kognitivnog otkrića koriste ortografske, fonetičke i semantičke opcije temeljene na temelju sličnosti. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu metodu za bogatstvo seta karakteristika, sa kognitivnim karakteristikama izvučenim iz ponašanja ljudskih čitača. Skupljamo podatke o ponašanju pogleda za mali uzorak kognita i pokazujemo da izvlačene kognitivne karakteristike pomažu zadatku kognitivnog otkrića. Međutim, kolekcija podataka i annotacija pogledajte je skup zadatak. Koristimo podatke o prikupljenom ponašanju pogleda kako bi predvidjeli kognitivne karakteristike za veći uzorak i pokazali da predviđene kognitivne karakteristike također značajno poboljšavaju učinkovitost zadataka. Prijavljujemo poboljšanja od 10% sa prikupljenim karakteristikama pogleda, a 12% koristeći predviđene karakteristike pogleda, preko prethodnih predloženih pristupa. Osim toga, objavljujemo podatke o skupljenim ponašanju pogleda zajedno sa našim kodom i međujezičkim modelima.', 'bn': 'মেশিন অনুবাদ, ক্রস-ভাষায় তথ্য পুনরুদ্ধার, গণমাত্রিক ফিল্জোনেটিক্স এবং ক্রস-ভাষায় নামের ক্রোশ-ভাষার প্রতিষ্ঠানের নাম স্বীকৃতি প্রদান করার জন কোগ্নেট ডিজেক্টরের কাজের পূর্ববর্তী প্রযুক্তি ব্যবহার করে অরটোগ্রাফিক, ফোনেটিক এবং সেমেন্টিক বৈশিষ্ট্যের এই কাগজটিতে আমরা এই বৈশিষ্ট্যের সমৃদ্ধির জন্য একটি নোভেল পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি, যার সাথে মানুষের পাঠকদের দৃষ্টির আচরণ থেকে বের করা  আমরা কোক্নেটের একটি ছোট নম্বরের জন্য দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি তথ্য সংগ্রহ করি এবং দেখা যাচ্ছি যে কোগ্নেটের সনাক্তির কাজে সাহায্য করে। তবে তথ্য সংগ্রহের দিকে তাকাও এবং বিরক্তিকর কাজের জন্য দারুণ। আমরা সংগ্রহ করা চোখের আচরণের তথ্য ব্যবহার করি বড় ধরনের চেহারার বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্য প্রত্যাখ্যান করার জন্য এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে প্রত্যেক চিন্ত আমরা পূর্বের প্রস্তাবিত প্রস্তাবিত প্রাক্তির ব্যাপারে সংগ্রহিত চোখের বৈশিষ্ট্য দিয়ে ১০ শতাংশের উন্নয়নের সংবাদ প্রদান এছাড়াও, আমরা সংগ্রহিত চোখের আচরণের তথ্য মুক্তি দেই আমাদের কোড এবং ক্রাস্ভুয়াল মডেলের সাথে।', 'et': 'Kongaatide automaatne tuvastamine aitab kaasa masintõlke, keeleülese teabekogumise, arvutusliku fülogeneetika ja keeleülese nimega isikute tuvastamise nõuetele. Varasemad lähenemisviisid kogniatide tuvastamiseks kasutavad ortograafiliste, foneetiliste ja semantiliste sarnasuste funktsioonide komplekte. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uudse meetodi funktsioonikomplektide rikastamiseks, kus inimlugejate pilgukäitumisest välja võetud kognitiivsed funktsioonid. Kogume väikese kongaatide valimi pilgukäitumise andmeid ja näitame, et ekstraheeritud kognitiivsed funktsioonid aitavad kongaatide tuvastamisel kaasa. Vaatamisandmete kogumine ja märgistamine on siiski kulukas ülesanne. Kogutud pilgukäitumise andmete abil prognoosime suurema valimi kognitiivseid omadusi ja näitame, et prognoositavad kognitiivsed omadused parandavad oluliselt ka ülesande tulemuslikkust. Eelnevalt kavandatud lähenemisviisidega võrreldes teatame, et kogutud pilgufunktsioonide puhul on paranenud 10% ja prognoositud pilgufunktsioonide puhul 12%. Lisaks avaldame kogutud pilgukäitumise andmed koos oma koodi ja keeleüleste mudelitega.', 'fi': 'Kogniaattien automaattinen tunnistus auttaa konekäännöksen, monikielisen tiedonhaun, laskennallisen fylogenetiikan ja monikielisen nimettyjen entiteettien tunnistamisen loppupään NLP-tehtävissä. Aiemmissa lähestymistavoissa käytetään ortografisia, foneettisia ja semanttisia samankaltaisuuksia. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme uudenlaista menetelmää ominaisuuksien rikastamiseen, jossa kognitiiviset ominaisuudet on saatu ihmisen katsojakäyttäytymisestä. Keräämme katseen käyttäytymistä koskevaa tietoa pienestä kognaattinäytteestä ja osoitamme, että kognitiiviset ominaisuudet auttavat kognaattien havaitsemisessa. Katseludatan kerääminen ja merkitseminen on kuitenkin kallis tehtävä. Kerättyjen katsekäyttäytymistietojen avulla ennustamme kognitiivisia ominaisuuksia suuremmassa otoksessa ja osoitamme, että ennakoidut kognitiiviset ominaisuudet parantavat myös merkittävästi tehtävän suorituskykyä. Raportoimme parannuksia 10% kerättyjen katseominaisuuksien ja 12% ennustettujen katseominaisuuksien avulla aiemmin ehdotettuihin lähestymistapoihin verrattuna. Lisäksi julkaisemme kerättyä katsekäyttäytymistietoa sekä koodimme ja monikieliset mallit.', 'jv': 'Automatically detection of knowns help downtream NLP tasks politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness In this paper, we proposal a new method for weakening the settings of the parameters, with kowise parameters extract from the reader\'s perspective. Awale politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan kelompok tarjamahan kanggo ngerasai perusahaan kelompok ingkang sampulan sing luwih dumadhi lan ingkang dipenestik perusahaan kowisiyé, padha uga, sing berarti operasi nggawe barang nggawe Awak dhéwé éntuk 10% aturan kanggo nggawe perusahaan aturan anyar nggawe, lan 12% supoyo perusahaan kanggo ngerayawih nyong, padha apik perusahaan kanggo diangkat sabanjuré. Daftar kok, kita mbukak perusahaan podho sing nggawe gerakan karo kode karo model sing ngatan langgar.', 'sk': 'Samodejno zaznavanje kognitov pomaga nadaljnjim nalogam NLP strojnega prevajanja, medjezičnega pridobivanja informacij, računalniške filogenetike in medjezičnega prepoznavanja imenovanih entitet. Prejšnji pristopi za nalogo zaznavanja kognitov uporabljajo ortografske, fonetične in semantične podobnosti temelječe nabore značilnosti. V prispevku predlagamo novo metodo za obogatitev naborov funkcij s kognitivnimi značilnostmi, pridobljenimi iz vedenja človeških bralcev gleda. Zbiramo podatke o vedenju pogleda za majhen vzorec kognitov in kažemo, da izvlečene kognitivne funkcije pomagajo pri zaznavanju kognitov. Vendar pa je zbiranje podatkov gledanja in označevanje draga naloga. Zbrane podatke o vedenju pogleda uporabljamo za napovedovanje kognitivnih značilnosti za večji vzorec in pokažemo, da predvidene kognitivne značilnosti tudi bistveno izboljšajo uspešnost naloge. V primerjavi s predhodno predlaganimi pristopi poročamo o izboljšanju 10% pri zbranih značilnostih pogleda in 12% pri predvidenih značilnostih pogleda. Poleg tega objavljamo zbrane podatke o vedenju pogleda skupaj z našo kodo in medjezičnimi modeli.', 'ha': '@ action: button @ info: whatsthis Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata hanyoyi wa ta rikitar da tsari masu amfani da, da wasu masu sanyi da aka fito daga aikin manyan karatun mutane. Munã sama danne masu aikin gani zuwa wani misali mai ƙaranci na samun koketa kuma Muke nuna cewa masu samun kognitive zafi taimakon aikin canza kokokote. A lokacin da, ka dũba samun mutane da zane-zane wani aikin mai kyauta ne. We use the collected gaze behaviour data to predict cognitive features for a larger sample and show that predicted cognitive features, also, significantly improve the task performance.  Tuna buga mafarinta da 10% da aka samirtar da wasu hanyõyi na gannai, da 12% da ke yi amfani da fassarar idãnun da aka ƙayyade shi, daga sami-gabanin da aka buɗa. Furan haka, Munã sakar da danne da aka samu da takardar idãnun da ke cikin kowanmu da misãlai masu tsakanin harshen.', 'bo': "Automatic detection of cognates helps downstream NLP tasks of Machine Translation, Cross-lingual Information Retrieval, Computational Phylogenetics and Cross-lingual Named Entity Recognition. སྔོན་གྱི་འཛུལ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གཟུགས In this paper, we propose a novel method for enriching the feature sets, with cognitive features extracted from human readers' gaze behavior. ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་པའི་དཔེར་བརྗོད་ཆུང་ཀྱི་ལྟ་སྟངས་གཙང་བཙུགས་པའི་བྱ་ཚུལ་ཆ་སྒྲིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་རྩོལ་བ་སྟོན་དགོས། ཡིན་ནའང་། ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱས་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་སྙན་ཚུལ་ནི་ལས་འགུལ་སྡུད་པ་ཞིག་རེད། ང་ཚོས་མཉམ་གསོག་སྡུད་པའི་ལྟ་སྟངས་གནད་སྡུད་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་སྔོན་སྟོན་པའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་བྱས་ནས་མཐོང་སྣང་བ་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན ང་ཚོས་ཆ་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡོམས་པའི་ལྟ་ཚུལ་ཆ་ཚན་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་འགྱུར་རྐྱེན་ཚད་༡༠་བར་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ་དང་། སྔོན་གྱི་གནད་དོན དེ་ལས་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་སྦྲགས་པའི་མཐོང་སྣང་ཚིག་གི་ཨང་རིགས་དང་སྐད་ཆ་ཆ་མཐོང་གི་མིག་རྣམས་མཐོང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད", 'he': 'גילוי אוטומטי של קוגנייטים עוזר למטה למשימות NLP של התרגום מכונות, השיג מידע בין שפות, פילוגנטיקה מחשבית, זיהוי איכות בשם בין שפות. גישות קודמות למשימה של זיהוי קוגנייט משתמשות בסיסים אורטוגרפיים, פונטיים וסמנטיים. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים שיטה חדשה לעשיר את קבוצת המאפיינים, עם תכונות קוגניטיביות מווצאות מתנהגות הקוראים האנושיים. אנו אוספים נתונים על התנהגות מבט לדגימה קטנה של קוגנייטים ומראים שהתכונות קוגניטיביות החוזרות עוזרות למשימה של זיהוי קוגנייטים. עם זאת, אוסף נתוני מבט והציון הוא משימה יקרה. אנו משתמשים בנתונים על התנהגות המבטים האסופים כדי לחזות תכונות קוגניטיביות לדגימה גדולה יותר ולהראות כי תכונות קוגניטיביות צפויות, גם, משפר באופן משמעותי את ביצוע המשימה. אנחנו מדווחים על שיפורים של 10% עם תכונות המבט האסופים, ו-12% באמצעות תכונות המבט הנצפויים, על הגישויים המוצעים קודם לכן. חוץ מזה, אנחנו משחררים את נתוני התנהגות המבטים האסופים יחד עם הקוד שלנו ודוגמנים דרך שפתיים.'}
{'en': 'Probing the Probing Paradigm : Does Probing Accuracy Entail Task Relevance?', 'ar': 'استقصاء نموذج الاستقصاء: هل يستلزم استقصاء الدقة صلة المهمة؟', 'es': 'Sondeo del paradigma de sondeo: ¿La precisión del sondeo implica relevancia para la tarea?', 'pt': 'Sondando o Paradigma da Sondagem: A Precisão da Sondagem Implica a Relevância da Tarefa?', 'fr': 'Analyse du paradigme de palpage\xa0: La précision du palpage implique-t-elle la pertinence de la tâche\xa0?', 'ja': 'Probing the Probing Paradigm: Probing Accuracy Is Entail Task Relevance?', 'zh': '测曰:探准确性任否相关性?', 'ru': 'Зондирование парадигмы зондирования: влечет ли за собой точность зондирования актуальность задачи?', 'hi': 'जांच प्रतिमान की जांच करना: क्या सटीकता की जांच कार्य प्रासंगिकता को शामिल करती है?', 'ga': 'An Paraidím Fiosrúcháin a Scrúdú: An mbaineann Ábharthacht an Tasc le Cruinneas a Scrúdú?', 'hu': 'A szondázási paradicsom vizsgálata: A szondázási pontosság növeli a feladat relevanciáját?', 'ka': 'ოპჲბლვმთრვ პაეთდმა: ოპჲბლვმთრვ ლთ ოპაგთლნჲჟრრა ჲრ გჟთფკთ პაბჲრთ?', 'el': 'Δοκιμή του Παραδείγματος ανίχνευσης: Η ακρίβεια ανίχνευσης σχετίζεται με την εργασία;', 'it': 'Sondare il paradigma della sonda: la precisione della sonda aumenta la rilevanza del compito?', 'kk': 'Тексеру парадигмін тексеру: Бүкіл тапсырманың дұрыстығын тексеру керек пе?', 'mk': 'Истражување на парадигмот за проверка: Дали проверката на точноста е релевантна за задачата?', 'lt': 'Bandymo paradigma: Ar tikslumo bandymas atitinka užduotį?', 'mt': 'Il-Probar tal-Paradigma tal-Probar: Is-Probar tal-Akkwatezza għandu x’jaqsam mal-kompitu kollu?', 'ms': 'Menguji Paradigm Pengujian: Adakah Pengujian Kepastian Menggunakan Relevansi Tugas?', 'ml': 'പ്രോബിങ്ങ് പാരാഡിഗം പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Судалгааны Парадигм-ыг судалгаад: Дуудлын тохиромжтой Энтейл ажлын харилцаа шалгах уу?', 'pl': 'Badanie paradygmatu sondowania: Czy dokładność sondowania zwiększa znaczenie zadań?', 'ro': 'Proiectarea Paradigmului de sondare: Există acuratețea sondării relevanța sarcinii?', 'no': 'Prøver Probing Paradigm: Prøver nøyaktighet for fullstendig oppgåve?', 'sv': 'Probing the Probing Paradigm: Förstår Probing Noggrancy uppgiftsrelevans?', 'sr': 'Da li je proba povezanost sa točnošću kompletne zadatke?', 'ta': 'பரிசோதிக்கும் அளபுரு: சரியான மின்னஞ்சல் பணி தொடர்பு ஏற்படுத்துகிறதா?', 'ur': 'آزمائش جنت کی آزمائش: کیا دقیق کام کی نسبت ہے؟', 'so': 'Ka baaraandegista baaritaanka: Heshiiska shaqada ee qasabka ka baaraandegista qasabka?', 'si': 'පරීක්ෂණ පාර්ඩිග්ම් එක පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න: හරියටම අන්තිම කාර්යාලය සම්බන්ධතාවක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න ප', 'vi': 'Đang xác định sản xuất ra công tác liên quan?', 'uz': 'Tahrirlash parametrlarini tahrirlash: Hech qanday pochta vazifa haqida bogʻlash mumkin?', 'bg': 'Пробване на парадигмата на сондирането: Дали точността на сондирането увеличава релевантността на задачите?', 'hr': 'Ispitivanje paradigma za probu: Da li je proba povezanost sa preciznošću kompletnih zadataka?', 'nl': 'Proberen van het sondeparadijs: Is de nauwkeurigheid van de sonde relevant voor taken?', 'da': 'Probing the Probing Paradigm: Er Probing nøjagtighed større relevans for opgaverne?', 'id': 'Menguji Paradigma Pengujian: Apakah Pengujian Kepastian Menentukan Relevansi Tugas?', 'fa': 'تحقیق پارادیگ امتحان: آیا تحقیق مرتبط کامل دقیق است؟', 'ko': '탐색 탐색 모델: 탐색의 정확성은 임무의 관련성을 의미하는가?', 'de': 'Sondierung des Probing Paradigmas: Ist die Genauigkeit der Sondierung von Bedeutung?', 'sq': 'Probing the Probing Paradigm: Does Probing Accuracy Entail Task Relevance?', 'sw': 'Kujaribu jaribio la Kujaribu: Je, Kujaribu Kuhusiana na Kazi za Barua pepe?', 'tr': "Probation Paradigm'y امتحان edip bilýärmi?", 'hy': 'Արդյո՞ք ճշգրտության փորձը վերաբերում է խնդրի կարևորությանը:', 'af': 'Probeer die Probing Paradigm: Probeer Waardige Entale Opdrag Relevasie?', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'ca': "Probar el paràdigma de la prova: La prova d'exactitud té importància a la tasca?", 'bn': 'প্রক্রিবিং প্যারাডিগুলো প্রমাণ করছে: কি সুযোগ প্রক্রিয়া ই-মেইল কাজের সম্পর্ক?', 'bs': 'Ispitivanje paradigma za probu: da li je proba povezanost sa preciznošću kompletnih zadataka?', 'az': 'Testing Paradigmu t…ôŇükil etm…ôk: QńĪymetlik Entail Task Relativity Testing?', 'fi': 'Probing Paradigm: Onko Probing Accuracy tärkeä tehtävä?', 'et': 'Proovimise paradigmi uurimine: kas proovimise täpsus suurendab ülesannete olulisust?', 'cs': 'Probírání paradálu sondování: Má přesnost sondování význam úkolů?', 'jv': 'Ngawe ngembok Paratimer sing uwong: Mbak ngembok Omahno Entemail ?', 'he': 'בדיקת הפרדיגמה: האם בדיקת בדיקת מתאימה למשימה?', 'ha': 'QDialogButtonBox', 'sk': 'Prodiranje paradigme sondenja: Ali natančnost sondenja povečuje pomembnost nalog?', 'bo': 'ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་མི་ས Paradigm དེ་ལྟ་བྱེད། ངེས་པར་དྲང་འབྲེལ་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་མཐུན་དུ་བལྟ་བྱེད་པ་ཡིན་ནམ'}
{'en': 'Although neural models have achieved impressive results on several NLP benchmarks, little is understood about the mechanisms they use to perform language tasks. Thus, much recent attention has been devoted to analyzing the sentence representations learned by neural encoders, through the lens of ‘probing’ tasks. However, to what extent was the information encoded in sentence representations, as discovered through a probe, actually used by the model to perform its task? In this work, we examine this probing paradigm through a case study in Natural Language Inference, showing that models can learn to encode linguistic properties even if they are not needed for the task on which the model was trained. We further identify that pretrained word embeddings play a considerable role in encoding these properties rather than the training task itself, highlighting the importance of careful controls when designing probing experiments. Finally, through a set of controlled synthetic tasks, we demonstrate models can encode these properties considerably above chance-level, even when distributed in the data as random noise, calling into question the interpretation of absolute claims on probing tasks.', 'fr': "Bien que les modèles neuronaux aient obtenu des résultats impressionnants sur plusieurs points de référence de la PNL, on comprend peu de choses sur les mécanismes qu'ils utilisent pour effectuer des tâches langagières. Ainsi, une grande attention a été récemment consacrée à l'analyse des représentations de phrases apprises par les codeurs neuronaux, à travers le prisme des tâches de «\xa0sondage\xa0». Cependant, dans quelle mesure les informations codées dans les représentations de phrases, telles que découvertes au moyen d'une sonde, ont-elles été réellement utilisées par le modèle pour accomplir sa tâche\xa0? Dans ce travail, nous examinons ce paradigme de sondage à travers une étude de cas dans Natural Language Inference, montrant que les modèles peuvent apprendre à coder des propriétés linguistiques même si elles ne sont pas nécessaires pour la tâche sur laquelle le modèle a été formé. Nous avons également constaté que les intégrations de mots préentraînées jouent un rôle considérable dans le codage de ces propriétés plutôt que dans la tâche d'apprentissage elle-même, ce qui souligne l'importance de contrôles minutieux lors de la conception d'expériences de sondage. Enfin, grâce à un ensemble de tâches synthétiques contrôlées, nous démontrons que les modèles peuvent coder ces propriétés bien au-delà du niveau aléatoire, même lorsqu'elles sont distribuées dans les données sous forme de bruit aléatoire, ce qui remet en question l'interprétation des revendications absolues sur les tâches de sondage.", 'es': 'Aunque los modelos neuronales han logrado resultados impresionantes en varios puntos de referencia de la PNL, poco se sabe sobre los mecanismos que utilizan para realizar tareas lingüísticas. Por lo tanto, recientemente se ha dedicado mucha atención al análisis de las representaciones de oraciones aprendidas por los codificadores neuronales, a través de la lente de las tareas de «sondeo». Sin embargo, ¿hasta qué punto el modelo utilizó realmente la información codificada en las representaciones de oraciones, descubierta a través de una sonda, para realizar su tarea? En este trabajo, examinamos este paradigma de sondeo a través de un estudio de caso en Natural Language Inference, que muestra que los modelos pueden aprender a codificar propiedades lingüísticas incluso si no son necesarias para la tarea en la que se formó el modelo. Además, identificamos que las incrustaciones de palabras previamente entrenadas desempeñan un papel considerable en la codificación de estas propiedades en lugar de la tarea de capacitación en sí, lo que destaca la importancia de controles cuidadosos al diseñar experimentos de sondeo. Finalmente, a través de un conjunto de tareas sintéticas controladas, demostramos que los modelos pueden codificar estas propiedades considerablemente por encima del nivel de probabilidad, incluso cuando se distribuyen en los datos como ruido aleatorio, lo que pone en duda la interpretación de las afirmaciones absolutas sobre las tareas de sondeo.', 'ar': 'على الرغم من أن النماذج العصبية قد حققت نتائج رائعة في العديد من معايير البرمجة اللغوية العصبية ، إلا أنه لا يُفهم الكثير عن الآليات التي تستخدمها لأداء المهام اللغوية. وبالتالي ، تم تكريس قدر كبير من الاهتمام مؤخرًا لتحليل تمثيلات الجملة التي تعلمتها المشفرات العصبية ، من خلال عدسة مهام "التحقيق". ومع ذلك ، إلى أي مدى تم تشفير المعلومات في تمثيلات الجملة ، كما تم اكتشافها من خلال المسبار ، والتي استخدمها النموذج بالفعل لأداء مهمته؟ في هذا العمل ، ندرس نموذج الفحص هذا من خلال دراسة حالة في Natural Language Inference ، مما يوضح أن النماذج يمكن أن تتعلم ترميز الخصائص اللغوية حتى لو لم تكن مطلوبة للمهمة التي تم تدريب النموذج عليها. لقد حددنا أيضًا أن عمليات دمج الكلمات المُدربة مسبقًا تلعب دورًا كبيرًا في ترميز هذه الخصائص بدلاً من مهمة التدريب نفسها ، مما يبرز أهمية الضوابط الدقيقة عند تصميم تجارب التحقيق. أخيرًا ، من خلال مجموعة من المهام الاصطناعية الخاضعة للرقابة ، نوضح أن النماذج يمكنها ترميز هذه الخصائص أعلى بكثير من مستوى الفرصة ، حتى عند توزيعها في البيانات كضوضاء عشوائية ، مما يثير التساؤل حول تفسير المطالبات المطلقة بشأن مهام التحقيق.', 'pt': "Embora os modelos neurais tenham alcançado resultados impressionantes em vários benchmarks de PNL, pouco se sabe sobre os mecanismos que eles usam para realizar tarefas de linguagem. Assim, muita atenção recente tem sido dedicada à análise das representações de sentenças aprendidas por codificadores neurais, através das lentes de tarefas de 'sondagem'. No entanto, até que ponto as informações codificadas nas representações de sentenças, descobertas por meio de uma sonda, foram realmente usadas pelo modelo para realizar sua tarefa? Neste trabalho, examinamos esse paradigma de sondagem por meio de um estudo de caso em Inferência de Linguagem Natural, mostrando que os modelos podem aprender a codificar propriedades linguísticas mesmo que não sejam necessárias para a tarefa na qual o modelo foi treinado. Identificamos ainda que as incorporações de palavras pré-treinadas desempenham um papel considerável na codificação dessas propriedades, em vez da tarefa de treinamento em si, destacando a importância de controles cuidadosos ao projetar experimentos de sondagem. Finalmente, através de um conjunto de tarefas sintéticas controladas, demonstramos que modelos podem codificar essas propriedades consideravelmente acima do nível de chance, mesmo quando distribuídos nos dados como ruído aleatório, questionando a interpretação de afirmações absolutas em tarefas de sondagem.", 'ja': 'ニューラルモデルは、いくつかのNLPベンチマークで印象的な結果を達成しているが、言語タスクを実行するために使用するメカニズムについてはほとんど理解されていない。 したがって、「プロービング」タスクのレンズを通じて、ニューラルエンコーダによって学習された文章表現の分析には、最近多くの注意が払われている。 しかし、プローブを通じて発見されたような文章表現にエンコードされた情報は、モデルが実際にそのタスクを実行するためにどの程度使用されましたか？ この研究では、自然言語推論のケーススタディを通じてこのプロービングパラダイムを検討し、モデルが訓練されたタスクに必要でなくても、モデルが言語的性質を符号化することを学ぶことができることを示します。 私たちはさらに、事前に訓練された単語の埋め込みが、訓練タスク自体ではなく、これらの特性をエンコードする上でかなりの役割を果たしていることを特定し、プローブ実験を設計する際の慎重な制御の重要性を強調しています。 最後に、一連の制御された合成タスクを通じて、モデルは、データ内にランダムノイズとして分布していても、チャンスレベルよりもかなり高いこれらの特性を符号化することができることを実証し、プロービングタスクにおける絶対主張の解釈に疑問を投げかけます。', 'zh': '虽神经形于数NLP,而人知之甚少于言。 故近意皆集于探镜头以析神经编码器学之句。 然探测器见之,以句为文编码信在多大程度,而实行之乎? 于此,吾以自然语言理考之,明编码言性,虽习之不须也。 臣等更定,预训之词编码此非训练任务身之用,此特出于计测实验而审制之要也。 最后因群受控之合,证模形之可以远高于机编码,虽随机噪声布于数据,亦质疑于探务之绝对声明之说。', 'hi': "यद्यपि तंत्रिका मॉडल ने कई एनएलपी बेंचमार्क पर प्रभावशाली परिणाम प्राप्त किए हैं, लेकिन भाषा कार्यों को करने के लिए उपयोग किए जाने वाले तंत्र के बारे में बहुत कम समझा जाता है। इस प्रकार, हाल ही में ध्यान 'जांच' कार्यों के लेंस के माध्यम से, तंत्रिका एनकोडर द्वारा सीखे गए वाक्य प्रतिनिधित्व का विश्लेषण करने के लिए समर्पित किया गया है। हालांकि, वाक्य प्रतिनिधित्व में एन्कोडेड जानकारी किस हद तक थी, जैसा कि एक जांच के माध्यम से खोजा गया था, वास्तव में मॉडल द्वारा अपना कार्य करने के लिए उपयोग किया जाता है? इस काम में, हम प्राकृतिक भाषा अनुमान में एक मामले के अध्ययन के माध्यम से इस जांच प्रतिमान की जांच करते हैं, यह दिखाते हुए कि मॉडल भाषाई गुणों को एन्कोड करना सीख सकते हैं, भले ही उन्हें उस कार्य के लिए आवश्यक न हो जिस पर मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित किया गया था। हम आगे की पहचान करते हैं कि प्रीट्रेन्ड शब्द एम्बेडिंग प्रशिक्षण कार्य के बजाय इन गुणों को एन्कोडिंग करने में काफी भूमिका निभाते हैं, जो जांच प्रयोगों को डिजाइन करते समय सावधानीपूर्वक नियंत्रण के महत्व को उजागर करते हैं। अंत में, नियंत्रित सिंथेटिक कार्यों के एक सेट के माध्यम से, हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि मॉडल इन गुणों को मौका-स्तर से काफी ऊपर एन्कोड कर सकते हैं, यहां तक कि जब डेटा में यादृच्छिक शोर के रूप में वितरित किया जाता है, तो जांच कार्यों पर पूर्ण दावों की व्याख्या पर सवाल उठाया जाता है।", 'ru': 'Хотя нейронные модели достигли впечатляющих результатов по нескольким критериям NLP, мало что известно о механизмах, которые они используют для выполнения языковых задач. Таким образом, в последнее время большое внимание уделяется анализу представлений предложений, изучаемых нейронными кодировщиками, через призму «зондирующих» задач. Однако в какой степени информация, закодированная в представлениях предложений, обнаруженная с помощью зонда, фактически используется моделью для выполнения своей задачи? В этой работе мы рассматриваем эту парадигму зондирования с помощью тематического исследования в Natural Language Inference, показывающего, что модели могут научиться кодировать лингвистические свойства, даже если они не нужны для задачи, на которой модель была обучена. Мы далее определяем, что предварительно обученные вставки слов играют значительную роль в кодировании этих свойств, а не в самой обучающей задаче, подчеркивая важность тщательного контроля при разработке экспериментов по зондированию. Наконец, с помощью набора управляемых синтетических задач мы демонстрируем, что модели могут кодировать эти свойства значительно выше случайного уровня, даже при распределении в данных в виде случайного шума, ставя под сомнение интерпретацию абсолютных утверждений по зондирующим задачам.', 'ga': "Cé go bhfuil torthaí suntasacha bainte amach ag samhlacha néarúla ar roinnt tagarmharcanna NLP, is beag a thuigtear faoi na meicníochtaí a úsáideann siad chun tascanna teanga a dhéanamh. Mar sin, díríodh go leor airde le déanaí ar anailís a dhéanamh ar na léirithe abairtí a d'fhoghlaim ionchódóirí néaracha, trí lionsa na dtascanna `probing'. Mar sin féin, cé chomh mór agus a d’úsáid an tsamhail an t-eolas a ionchódaíodh i léirithe abairtí, mar a fuarthas amach trí fhiosrú, chun a tasc a chomhlíonadh? San obair seo, scrúdaíonn muid an paraidím fiosraithe seo trí chás-staidéar in Tátal Teanga Nádúrtha, a thaispeánann gur féidir le samhlacha foghlaim conas airíonna teanga a ionchódú fiú mura bhfuil siad ag teastáil don tasc ar cuireadh oiliúint ar an tsamhail. Aithnímid freisin go n-imríonn leabaithe focal réamhoilte ról suntasach in ionchódú na n-airíonna seo seachas an tasc oiliúna féin, ag leagan béime ar an tábhacht a bhaineann le rialuithe cúramacha agus turgnaimh iniúchta á ndearadh. Mar fhocal scoir, trí thascanna sintéiseacha rialaithe, léirímid gur féidir le samhlacha na hairíonna seo a ionchódú go mór os cionn leibhéal na seans, fiú nuair a dhéantar iad a dháileadh sna sonraí mar thorann randamach, rud a chuireann amhras faoi léirmhíniú na n-éileamh iomlán ar thascanna fiosrúcháin.", 'ka': "თუმცა ნეიროლური მოდელები გავაკეთეთ ინტერფექციური შედეგი NLP ბენქმარკზე, რამდენიმე მარტივია, რომლებიც ისინი გამოყენებენ ენის დავაკეთებებისთვის. ამიტომ ძალიან ბოლო აღმოჩენება, რომელიც ნეიროლური კოდერებით გასწავლილი წესების განსაზღვრებას ანალიზაციისთვის, რომელიც `პრობენტის' მოქმედების ლენსის გა მაგრამ, რამდენიმე განმავლობაში იყო ინფორმაცია, როგორც აღმოჩენა პრობეზე, როგორც მოდელის გამოყენება საქმე მუშაობაში? ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ შევხედავთ ამ პრობენტის პარადიგმის შესახებ ნახვა ენერგიის ინფერენციაში, რომელიც მოდელები შეიძლება ვისწავლოთ ენერგიოსტიკური განსაზღვრების კოდირება, თუმცა ისინი არ უნდა ი ჩვენ უფრო განვიცნობით, რომ საკუთარი სიტყვები, რომელიც საკუთარი სიტყვები იყოს ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანი პროლია ამ საკუთარი კოდირებაში, მაგრამ საკუთარი საკუთარი მუშაობა, რომელიც საბოლოოდ, კონტროლური სინტეტიკური დავალებების ნაწილად, ჩვენ მოდენსტრებით მოდენსტრებით შეგვიძლია ამ მნიშვნელობების კონტროლეციას ძალიან უფრო მეტი ქანსის დონე, მაგრამ როდესაც მონაცემში გა", 'it': "Sebbene i modelli neurali abbiano ottenuto risultati impressionanti su diversi benchmark PNL, poco si capisce circa i meccanismi che utilizzano per eseguire compiti linguistici. Così, molta attenzione recente è stata dedicata all'analisi delle rappresentazioni di frase apprese dagli encoder neurali, attraverso la lente dei compiti `sonding'. Tuttavia, in che misura l'informazione è stata codificata nelle rappresentazioni di frasi, come scoperto attraverso una sonda, effettivamente utilizzata dal modello per eseguire il suo compito? In questo lavoro, esaminiamo questo paradigma sondante attraverso un caso di studio in Natural Language Inference, mostrando che i modelli possono imparare a codificare le proprietà linguistiche anche se non sono necessari per il compito su cui il modello è stato addestrato. Identifichiamo inoltre che le incorporazioni di parole pre-addestrate svolgono un ruolo considerevole nella codifica di queste proprietà piuttosto che il compito di addestramento stesso, evidenziando l'importanza di controlli accurati nella progettazione di esperimenti di sonda. Infine, attraverso una serie di compiti sintetici controllati, dimostriamo che i modelli possono codificare queste proprietà notevolmente al di sopra del livello di probabilità, anche se distribuiti nei dati come rumore casuale, mettendo in discussione l'interpretazione di affermazioni assolute sui compiti di sonda.", 'hu': 'Bár a neurális modellek több NLP referenciaértéken is lenyűgöző eredményeket értek el, keveset értenek a nyelvi feladatok elvégzéséhez használt mechanizmusokról. Így a közelmúltban sok figyelmet fordítottunk a neurális kódolók által megtanult mondatábrázolások elemzésére, a "probing" feladatok lencséjén keresztül. Azonban milyen mértékben kódolták az információt mondatok ábrázolásában, amint azt egy szondán keresztül fedezték fel, és a modell ténylegesen használta a feladat elvégzéséhez? Ebben a munkában egy esettanulmány keretében vizsgáljuk meg ezt a vizsgálati paradigmát a Natural Language Inference című vizsgálatában, amely azt mutatja, hogy a modellek megtanulhatják kódolni a nyelvi tulajdonságokat, még akkor is, ha azokra nincs szükség ahhoz a feladathoz, amelyre a modellt képezték. Megállapítjuk továbbá, hogy az előkészített szóbeágyazások jelentős szerepet játszanak ezeknek a tulajdonságoknak a kódolásában, nem pedig maga a képzési feladat, kiemelve a gondos ellenőrzések fontosságát a mérési kísérletek tervezésekor. Végezetül, ellenőrzött szintetikus feladatok során bemutatjuk, hogy a modellek ezeket a tulajdonságokat jóval a véletlenszint fölött tudják kódolni, még akkor is, ha az adatokban véletlenszerű zajként osztják el, megkérdőjelezve a mérési feladatokkal kapcsolatos abszolút állítások értelmezését.', 'lt': 'Nors nervų modeliai pasiekė įspūdingų rezultatų dėl kelių NLP lyginamųjų rodiklių, mažai suprantama apie mechanizmus, kuriuos jie naudoja kalbų užduotims atlikti. Taigi, daug pastarojo meto dėmesio buvo skiriama išanalizuojant nuorodų, kurias moko neurologiniai kodatoriai, rodymus naudojant „sondo“ užduočių sklaidytuvą. Vis dėlto, kokiu mastu informacija, kaip nustatyta per sondą, iš tikrųjų buvo naudojama modelio užduotims atlikti, buvo koduota sakinių atvaizdais? Šiame darbe išnagrinėjame šį bandymo paradigm ą atliekant atvejų tyrimą „Natural Language Inference“, kuriame parodoma, kad modeliai gali išmokti koduoti kalbines savybes, net jei jų nereikia užduotims, kuriomis buvo mokomas modelis. Be to, mes nustatome, kad išankstinio mokymo žodžių įtraukimas atlieka svarbų vaidmenį koduojant šias savybes, o ne pačią mokymo užduotį, pabrėžiant kruopščios kontrolės svarbą rengiant bandymus. Galiausiai, atlikdami kontroliuojamų sintetinių užduočių rinkinį, demonstruojame, kad modeliai gali koduoti šias savybes gerokai viršijant atsitiktinio lygio lygį, net jei jie paskirstomi duomenise kaip atsitiktinis triukšmas, todėl kyla abejonių dėl absoliučių teiginių apie tyrimo užduotis aiškinimo.', 'el': 'Αν και τα νευρωνικά μοντέλα έχουν επιτύχει εντυπωσιακά αποτελέσματα σε διάφορους δείκτες αναφοράς, ελάχιστα κατανοούνται για τους μηχανισμούς που χρησιμοποιούν για την εκτέλεση γλωσσικών εργασιών. Έτσι, πολύ πρόσφατη προσοχή έχει δοθεί στην ανάλυση των αναπαραστάσεων προτάσεων που μαθαίνουν οι νευρωνικοί κωδικοποιητές, μέσα από το φακό των εργασιών "ανίχνευσης". Ωστόσο, σε ποιο βαθμό οι πληροφορίες κωδικοποιήθηκαν σε αναπαραστάσεις προτάσεων, όπως ανακαλύφθηκαν μέσω ενός ανιχνευτή, χρησιμοποιήθηκαν πραγματικά από το μοντέλο για να εκτελέσει το έργο του; Σε αυτή την εργασία, εξετάζουμε αυτό το μοντέλο μέσω μιας μελέτης περίπτωσης στη Φυσική Γλώσσα, δείχνοντας ότι τα μοντέλα μπορούν να μάθουν να κωδικοποιούν γλωσσικές ιδιότητες ακόμα και αν δεν είναι απαραίτητα για την εργασία στην οποία εκπαιδεύτηκε το μοντέλο. Αναγνωρίζουμε περαιτέρω ότι οι προκαθορισμένες ενσωματώσεις λέξεων διαδραματίζουν σημαντικό ρόλο στην κωδικοποίηση αυτών των ιδιοτήτων και όχι στην ίδια την εργασία κατάρτισης, τονίζοντας τη σημασία των προσεκτικών ελέγχων κατά τον σχεδιασμό των πειραμάτων ανίχνευσης. Τέλος, μέσω ενός συνόλου ελεγχόμενων συνθετικών εργασιών, καταδεικνύουμε ότι τα μοντέλα μπορούν να κωδικοποιήσουν αυτές τις ιδιότητες σημαντικά πάνω από το επίπεδο της τύχης, ακόμα και όταν διανέμονται στα δεδομένα ως τυχαίος θόρυβος, θέτοντας υπό αμφισβήτηση την ερμηνεία των απόλυτων αξιώσεων για τις εργασίες ανίχνευσης.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d കുറച്ച് NLP ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്കുകളില്\u200d മികച്ച ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നേടിയെടുത്തിട്ടുണ്ടെങ്കിലും, ഭാഷയുടെ ജോലികള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത അതുകൊണ്ട്, ഏറ്റവും അടുത്തുള്ള ശ്രദ്ധയില്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d കോഡോര്\u200dഡുകള്\u200d പഠിച്ച വാക്കിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികളെ അന്വേഷിക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിച്ചി എന്നാലും, വാക്കിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികളില്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എന്തിനായിരുന്നു അതിന്റെ ജോലി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു പ്രോബിന്\u200dറെ വഴ ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ പരിശോധിക്കുന്നത് സ്വാഭാവ ഭാഷയുടെ പരിശോധനത്തിലൂടെ പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. മോഡല്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ജോലിക്കുള്ള പ്രവ പരീക്ഷിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d സൂക്ഷ്മമായ നിയന്ത്രണങ്ങളുടെ പ്രധാന പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഇങ്ങനെയൊ അവസാനം, നിയന്ത്രിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു കൂട്ടം സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ടിക്കുന്ന ജോലികളിലൂടെയാണ് നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത്, ഈ ഗുണഗണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് സാധ്യതതയിലേക്ക് മ', 'mk': 'Although neural models have achieved impressive results on several NLP benchmarks, little is understood about the mechanisms they use to perform language tasks.  Затоа, многу неодамнешно внимание е посветено на анализирањето на претставувањата на речениците научени од невровните кодери, преку lenteта на „ сондирање “ задачите. Сепак, во каков степен биле информациите кодирани во претставувањата на речениците, откриени преку сонда, всушност користени од моделот за извршување на својата задача? Во оваа работа, го испитуваме овој парадигм на истражување преку случајна студија на природната инференција на јазикот, покажувајќи дека моделите можат да научат да ги кодираат јазичните сопствености дури и ако не се потребни за задачата на која моделот беше обучен. Понатаму идентификуваме дека претренираните зборови вложуваат значителна улога во кодирањето на овие сопствености наместо самата задача за обука, истакнувајќи ја важноста на внимателни контроли кога се дизајнираат експерименти за истражување. Конечно, преку сет контролирани синтетички задачи, демонстрираме дека моделите можат да ги кодираат овие сопствености значително над нивото на случајност, дури и кога се дистрибуираат во податоците како случајна бучава, ставајќи во прашање интерпретацијата на апсолутните тврде', 'ms': "Walaupun model saraf telah mencapai keputusan yang mengesankan pada beberapa tanda referensi NLP, sedikit dipahami tentang mekanisme yang mereka gunakan untuk melakukan tugas bahasa. Oleh itu, perhatian yang baru-baru ini telah ditujukan untuk menganalisis perwakilan kalimat yang dipelajari oleh pengekod saraf, melalui lensa tugas `probing'. Bagaimanapun, seberapa besar maklumat yang dikodifikasikan dalam perwakilan kalimat, seperti ditemui melalui sonda, sebenarnya digunakan oleh model untuk melakukan tugasnya? Dalam kerja ini, kami memeriksa paradigm a penyelidikan ini melalui kajian kes dalam Bahasa Alami, menunjukkan bahawa model boleh belajar mengekodkan ciri-ciri bahasa walaupun ia tidak diperlukan untuk tugas yang model dilatih. Kami juga mengenalpasti bahawa pembenaman perkataan terlatih bermain peran yang besar dalam pengekodan ciri-ciri ini daripada tugas latihan sendiri, menyatakan kepentingan kawalan berhati-hati ketika merancang percubaan penyelidikan. Akhirnya, melalui set tugas sintetik yang dikawal, kita menunjukkan model boleh mengekodkan ciri-ciri ini jauh di atas aras peluang, walaupun apabila disebarkan dalam data sebagai bunyi rawak, menanyakan soalan interpretasi klaim mutlak mengenai tugas penyelidikan.", 'kk': 'Невралдық моделдері NLP бағдарламаларының бірнеше нәтижелерін келтіргенде, тіл тапсырмаларын орындау үшін қолданатын механизмтер туралы тым түсінікті. Сондықтан, невралдық кодерлердің түсініктемелерін анализ ету үшін жаңа назардағы тәртібі "проб" тапсырмаларының линзиясы арқылы. Бірақ, мәліметтер тапсырмасын орындау үшін үлгі арқылы тапсырмалардың арқылы анықталған мәліметтер қанша деңгейінде кодтады? Бұл жұмыс ішінде, табиғи тіл инференциясындағы оқыту үшін, үлгілер лингвистикалық қасиеттерді кодтау үшін үйрене алады, егер олар үлгісін оқыту үшін қажет емес деген тапсырманың кодтауын үйрене алады. Біз осы қасиеттерді кодтау тапсырмасының өзінің орнына кодтау үшін әсер етілген сөздердің ендірудің маңыздылығын анықтаймыз. Соңында, бақылаған синтетикалық тапсырмаларды бақылап, үлгілер тапсырмаларды тексеру тапсырмаларды тексеру үшін бұл қасиеттерді тапсырмалар деңгейінде көмектесуге болады.', 'mt': 'Għalkemm mudelli newrali kisbu riżultati impressjonanti fuq diversi punti ta’ riferiment tal-NLP, ftit li xejn huwa mifhum dwar il-mekkaniżmi li jużaw biex iwettqu kompiti lingwistiċi. Għalhekk, ħafna attenzjoni reċenti ġiet iddedikata għall-analiżi tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet tas-sentenzi li tgħallmu minn kodifikaturi newrali, permezz tal-lenti tal-kompiti ta’ “sondage”. Madankollu, sa liema punt kienet l-informazzjoni kkodifikata fir-rappreżentazzjonijiet tas-sentenzi, kif skoperta permezz ta’ sonda, attwalment użata mill-mudell biex iwettaq il-kompitu tiegħu? F’dan ix-xogħol, eżaminaw dan il-paradigm a ta’ sondaġġ permezz ta’ studju ta’ każ fl-Inferenza tal-Lingwa Naturali, li juri li l-mudelli jistgħu jitgħallmu jikkodifikaw il-proprjetajiet lingwistiċi anki jekk mhumiex meħtieġa għall-kompitu li fuqu ġie mħarreġ il-mudell. Aħna nidentifikaw ukoll li l-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem imħarrġa minn qabel għandha rwol konsiderevoli fil-kodifikazzjoni ta’ dawn il-karatteristiċi minflok il-kompitu ta’ taħriġ innifsu, filwaqt li tenfasizza l-importanza ta’ kontrolli bir-reqqa fit-tfassil ta’ esperimenti ta’ sondaġġ. Fl-a ħħar nett, permezz ta’ sett ta’ kompiti sintetiċi kkontrollati, nistgħu nippruvaw li mudelli jistgħu jikkodifikaw dawn il-karatteristiċi b’mod konsiderevoli ’l fuq mil-livell ta’ ċans, anki meta mqassma fid-dejta bħala storbju każwali, li jqajmu dubju dwar l-interpretazzjoni ta’ dikjarazzjonijiet assoluti dwar kompiti ta’ sonda', 'mn': 'Хэдийгээр мэдрэлийн загварууд хэд хэдэн НЛП багахан шинжлэх ухаан дээр гайхалтай үр дүнг гаргасан ч хэл даалгаварын үйлдвэрлэлийн тухай хэрэглэдэг механизмуудын тухай бага ойлголт биш Иймээс сүүлийн үеийн анхаарал нь мэдрэлийн коддор суралцагдсан үгийг "судалгааны" үйл ажиллагааны линзийг ашиглан шинжилгээнд зориулсан. Гэхдээ хэдэн хэмжээнд өгүүлбэр илэрхийлэлд шинэ мэдээлэл хэрэглэгдсэн бэ? Энэ ажил дээр бид энэхүү судалгааны парадигмыг Байгалийн хэлний инференцийн судалгаагаар судалж, загвар нь хэлний чадварыг кодлож сурах боломжтой гэдгийг харуулж байна. Мөн бид дахиад тодорхойлогдсон үг бий болгох нь эдгээр тодорхойлолтуудыг суралцах үйл ажиллагааны оронд кодлохын тулд чухал үүрэг тогтоож, шалгалтын туршилтыг зохион байгуулах үед ухаантай удирдлагын чухал Эцэст нь, хяналттай синтетик даалгаваруудын тулд бид загваруудыг шаардлагатай даалгаваруудын түвшинд ихэвчлэн шинэчлэх боломжтой байдлыг үзүүлдэг. Мэдээлэл дээр санамсаргүй дуу гэж хуваалцсан ч гэсэн, судалгааны даалгаваруудын тодорхой', 'no': 'Selv om nøyralmodeller har oppnådd impresiv resultat på fleire NLP-benchmarker, er lite forstått om mekanismene dei brukar for å utføra språksoppgåver. Dette er derfor mykje nyleg oppmerksomheten tilgjengeleg for å analysera setningane som er lært av neuralkodarar gjennom lensen av «probing» oppgåver. I kva måte var informasjonen koda i setningssrepresentasjonar, som oppdaga gjennom eit probe, som faktisk brukt av modellen for å utføra oppgåva sin? I denne arbeiden er vi undersøkt denne proberingsparadigmen gjennom ein tilfeldige studie i naturspråk-inferensen, vist at modeller kan lære å kode språk-eigenskapar sjølv om dei ikkje er nødvendig for oppgåva som modellen var trent på. Vi identifiserer meir at innbyggingar av ordet har ein betydelig rolle i koding av desse eigenskapane i staden for oppgåva sjølv, og markerer viktigheten for forsiktige kontrollar når du designerer proberingseksperimenter. Etter slutt, gjennom eit sett av kontrollerte syntetiske oppgåver, kan vi demonstrere modeller å kode disse eigenskapane mykje over sjansnivå, sjølv når det er distribuert i dataene som tilfeldige støy, med å spørja om tolkinga av absolutte grenser på prøving av oppgåver.', 'pl': 'Chociaż modele neuronowe osiągnęły imponujące wyniki w kilku referencjach NLP, niewiele jest zrozumiane na temat mechanizmów wykorzystywanych do wykonywania zadań językowych. W związku z tym wiele ostatnich lat uwagi poświęcono analizie reprezentacji zdań nauczonych przez kodery neuronowe, przez soczewkę zadań "sondowania". Jednak w jakim stopniu informacja została zakodowana w reprezentacjach zdań, odkryta za pomocą sondy, rzeczywiście wykorzystana przez model do wykonywania swojego zadania? W niniejszej pracy badamy ten paradygmat sondujący poprzez studium przypadku w zakresie Natural Language Inference, pokazując, że modele mogą nauczyć się kodować właściwości językowe nawet jeśli nie są potrzebne do zadania, na którym model został przeszkolony. Ponadto zidentyfikowano, że wstępnie przeszkolone osadzenia słów odgrywają znaczącą rolę w kodowaniu tych właściwości, a nie samego zadania treningowego, podkreślając znaczenie starannej kontroli przy projektowaniu eksperymentów sondowych. Wreszcie, poprzez zestaw kontrolowanych zadań syntetycznych, demonstrujemy, że modele mogą kodować te właściwości znacznie powyżej poziomu przypadku, nawet gdy są rozproszone w danych jako szum losowy, poddając kwestionowaniu interpretacji bezwzględnych roszczeń dotyczących zadań sondowania.', 'ro': 'Deși modelele neurale au obținut rezultate impresionante pe mai multe criterii PNL, se înțelege puțin despre mecanismele pe care le folosesc pentru a efectua sarcini lingvistice. Astfel, multă atenție recentă a fost dedicată analizării reprezentărilor propozițiilor învățate de codificatorii neurali, prin lentila sarcinilor de sondare. Cu toate acestea, în ce măsură informația a fost codificată în reprezentări de propoziții, așa cum a fost descoperită printr-o sondă, de fapt utilizată de model pentru a-și îndeplini sarcina? În această lucrare, examinăm această paradigmă de sondare printr-un studiu de caz în Natural Language Inference, arătând că modelele pot învăța să codeze proprietățile lingvistice chiar dacă nu sunt necesare pentru sarcina pe care a fost instruit modelul. De asemenea, identificăm faptul că încorporările de cuvinte pre-instruite joacă un rol considerabil în codificarea acestor proprietăți, mai degrabă decât sarcina de instruire în sine, subliniind importanța controalelor atente la proiectarea experimentelor de sondare. În cele din urmă, printr-un set de sarcini sintetice controlate, demonstrăm că modelele pot codifica aceste proprietăți considerabil peste nivelul de șansă, chiar și atunci când sunt distribuite în date ca zgomot aleatoriu, punând în discuție interpretarea afirmațiilor absolute asupra sarcinilor de sondare.', 'sv': 'Även om neurala modeller har uppnått imponerande resultat på flera NLP-riktmärken, är lite förstådd om de mekanismer de använder för att utföra språkuppgifter. Således har mycket färsk uppmärksamhet ägnats åt att analysera de meningsrepresentationer som lärts av neurala kodare, genom linsen av "probing" uppgifter. Men i vilken utsträckning kodades informationen i meningsrepresentationer, som upptäcktes genom en sond, faktiskt användes av modellen för att utföra sin uppgift? I detta arbete undersöker vi detta proberingsparadigm genom en fallstudie i Natural Language Inference, som visar att modeller kan lära sig koda språkliga egenskaper även om de inte behövs för uppgiften som modellen tränats på. Vi identifierar vidare att förkränade ordinbäddningar spelar en betydande roll i kodningen av dessa egenskaper snarare än själva träningsuppgiften, vilket belyser vikten av noggranna kontroller vid utformningen av probningsexperiment. Slutligen, genom en uppsättning kontrollerade syntetiska uppgifter, visar vi att modeller kan koda dessa egenskaper betydligt över slumpnivå, även när de distribueras i data som slumpmässigt buller, vilket ifrågasätter tolkningen av absoluta anspråk på probningsuppgifter.', 'si': 'NLP බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති ඉතින්, ගොඩක් අලුත් අවධානයක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ වාක්ය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න, ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වි නමුත්, කොච්චර ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙන්නේ වාක්ය ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයේ තොරතුරු සංකේත කරලා තියෙන්නේ, ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වලින් මේ වැඩේ අපි මේ පරීක්ෂණ පාර්ඩිග්ම් එක පරීක්ෂා කරනවා ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් පෙන අපි තව ප්\u200dරතිරීක්ෂණ වචන ඇන්බෙන්ඩින්ග් වචන ප්\u200dරතිරීක්ෂණයක් මේ විශේෂතාවක් සංකේතනය කරනවා මේ විශේෂතාවක් පරීක්ෂණය විදිහ අන්තිමේදී, පාලනය කරලා තියෙන සංයුත්ත සංයුත්ත කාර්යයක් වලින්, අපි පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් මොඩේල් වලින් අවස්ථාවක් වලින් අවස්ථාවක් වලින් ම', 'sr': 'Iako su neuralni modeli postigli impresivne rezultate na nekoliko kriterija NLP-a, malo je shvatanje o mehanizmima koje koriste za izvršavanje jezičkih zadataka. Stoga je mnogo nedavne pažnje posvećena analiziranju predstava rečenice koje su naučili neuralni koderi kroz lense zadataka "proba". Međutim, u kolikoj mjeri je informacija kodirana u predstavljanju rečenica, otkrivena kroz sondu, koja je zapravo koristila model kako bi izvršila svoj zadatak? U ovom poslu, istražujemo ovu paradigmu za probu kroz studiju slučajeva u prirodnom jeziku, pokazujući da modeli mogu naučiti kodiranje jezičkih vlasništva čak i ako nisu potrebni za zadatak na kojem je model obučen. I dalje identifikujemo da uključene riječi imaju značajnu ulogu u kodiranju tih vlasništva umjesto samog zadatka obuke, naglašavajući važnost pažljivih kontrola kada dizajniraju eksperimente za istraživanje. Konačno, kroz niz kontroliranih sintetičkih zadataka, pokazujemo da modeli mogu da kodiraju te imovine mnogo iznad nivoa šanse, čak i kada se raspodijele u podacima kao nasumična buka, postavljajući u pitanje interpretaciju apsolutne tvrdnje o ispitivanju zadataka.', 'ta': "புதிய மாதிரிகள் சில NLP பெங்குருக்களின் மேல் முடிவுகள் பெருக்கினார்கள் எனினும், மொழிகள் பணிகளை செய்ய பயன்படுத்தும் முறைமை அதனால், அண்மையில் 'பாதுகாப்பு' பணிகள் மூலம் கற்ற வாக்கியத்தின் பிரதிநிதிகளை பரிசோதிக்க வேண்டும். However, to what extent was the information encoded in sentence representations, as discovered through a probe, actually used by the model to perform its task?  இந்த வேலையில், நாம் சாதாரண மொழி முரண்பாட்டில் இந்த பரிசோதிப்பாட்டை சோதிக்கிறோம். மாதிரி பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட பணிக்கு தேவையில்லையென்றாலும் மாத பரிசோதனைகளை வடிவமைக்கும்போது கவனமான கட்டுப்பாட்டுகளின் முக்கியமைப்பை குறியீட்டிற்கு பதிலாக இந்த பண்புகளை குறியீட்டில் ஒரு மிகவும் பெ இறுதியாக, கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்ட கூட்டிணைப்பு பணிகள் மூலம், நாம் மாதிரிகளை காட்ட முடியும் வாய்ப்பு மட்டத்திற்கு மேல் இந்த பண்புகளை குறியீடு முடியும், தரவ", 'so': "In kastoo sameynta neurada ah ay soo gaadheen resulto wanaagsan oo ku saabsan manfacyada NLP, wax yar looma garan karo meymisyada ay u isticmaalayaan inay sameeyaan shaqooyinka luuqada. Sidaas darteed waxaa loo talo galay in lagu analyeeyo qofka xuquuqda ah oo lagu baray qorshaha shaqada `baaritaanka'. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, macluumaadku maxay ugu qoran yihiin wakiilka xukunka, sida loo soo muujiyey imtixaanka, waxaa lagu isticmaalay tusaale si uu u sameeyo shaqadiisa? Shaqadan ayaannu ku baaraynaa imtixaanka baaritaanka marka lagu jiro waxbarashada afka dabiicadda ah, waxaynu tusnaynaa in modelalka ay baran karaan inay ka kooban karaan hantida luuqada, xitaa haddii aysan u baahnayn shaqada lagu baray tusaale ahaan. Sidoo kale waxaynu ognahay in ereyga ka soo baxsaday ay leedahay qayb aad u adag in ay kooban hantidan ay ka leedahay shaqada tababaridda, taas oo ku qoran muhiimka ilaalinta digtoonaanta marka lagu sameeyo baaritaanka. Finally, through a set of controlled synthetic tasks, we demonstrate models can encode these properties considerably above chance-level, even when distributed in the data as random noise, calling into question the interpretation of absolute claims on probing tasks.", 'ur': 'اگرچہ نئورل نمڈلوں نے چند NLP بنچم مارک پر اثر انگیز نتیجے پہنچ گئے ہیں، ان کی مکانیزوں کے بارے میں بہت کم سمجھ لیا جاتا ہے جو زبان کے کاموں کے لئے استعمال کرتے ہیں. اسی طرح بہت اخری توجه کی ہے کہ مجلس کی تعلیمات کی تحلیل کریں جو نیورل کوڈر کے ذریعہ سے سکھائی گئی ہے لیکن، کیسی اندازہ پر جماعت کی نمونات میں سیدھی معلومات کی گئی، جیسا ایک پرڈ کے ذریعہ آشکار کی گئی تھی، حقیقت میں مدل کے ذریعہ اس کے کام کا انجام کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا گیا تھا؟ اس کام میں ہم نے اس پرڈینگ پارادیگ کو تحقیق کر لیا ہے کہ ایک مطالعہ طبیعی زبان انفارنس میں ہے، جو دکھائے جاتے ہیں کہ مدلز زبان انفارنس کے اختیاروں کا کوڈ کرنا سکتے ہیں اگرچہ وہ اس کام کے لئے ضرورت نہیں ہے جس پر مدل تعلیم کی گئی تھی۔ ہم اس سے زیادہ پہچان رہے ہیں کہ پرٹرینڈ لفظ ایمبڈینگ ان کے خصوصوں کو اکڈینڈ کرنے کے لئے بہت اچھا رئوٹ بنا رہے ہیں اس کے علاوہ کہ تطالب کام خود ہی کی جگہ ہے، جب پرڈینگ آزمائش طراحی کرتا ہے، ذہمی کنٹرو آخر میں، ایک مجموعہ کے ذریعہ، ہم مدل کو دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ گواہی شانس سطح سے زیادہ زیادہ زیادہ محسوب کر سکتے ہیں، اگرچہ ڈاٹے میں ناقص غږ کے طور پر تقسیم ہوتے ہیں، اور مطلق تعبیر کے تفسیر کو سوال کرنے کے لئے پوچھتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Agar neyrolik modellari bir necha NLP parametrlarida juda yaxshi natijalar topishdi, lekin tilning vazifalarini bajarish uchun ishlatiladigan mekani haqida juda qisqa tushunmaydi. Шундай қилиб, жумладан кўп ҳужжат `сандиқлаш' вазифалари томонидан ўргатилган ҳужжатларни таҳлил қилиш учун фойдаланди. Lekin, bu vazifani bajarish uchun model ishlatiladigan so'zning xususiyatlariga qayta maʼlumot kodlash mumkin? Bu ishda, biz bu paradigmni tabiiy tilning Foydalanish orqali o'rganamiz va modellar o'rganilgan vazifani kodlash uchun o'rganamiz. Biz buni taʼminlovchi vazifani o'rganishdan ortiq so'zlarni kodlash uchun juda qiziqarli roli o'ylayapmiz. Taʼminlovchi vazifani o'rganishda taqdim boshqaruvchining muhimligini anglatish mumkin. Endi, bunday boshqaruvchi tizim vazifalari orqali biz modellar imkoniyatlarini imkoniyat darajada yuqori darajada kodlash mumkin. Agar maʼlumotlar tartibi holatda tarjima qilayotganda, vazifalarni tekshirish haqida toʻgʻri davom etishga murojaat qilamiz.", 'vi': 'Mặc dù các mô hình thần kinh đã đạt được kết quả ấn tượng với nhiều tiêu chuẩn lập tư bản, nhưng không hiểu được nhiều về các cơ chế dùng để thực hiện các nhiệm vụ ngôn ngữ. Do đó, gần đây đã được chú ý phân tích các biểu hiện từ các bộ mã hóa thần kinh học qua ống kính của các công việc "thăm dò". Tuy nhiên, trong mức độ nào thì thông tin đã được mã hóa trong các đơn trình diễn các bản án, như được phát hiện qua một con tầu do thám, thực sự được mô hình sử dụng để thực hiện nhiệm vụ? Trong công việc này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu mô hình thăm dò này qua một nghiên cứu về ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, cho thấy các mô hình có thể học cách mã hóa các đặc tính ngôn ngữ cho dù không cần thiết cho nhiệm vụ mà mô hình được đào tạo. Chúng tôi nhận ra rằng sự nhúng vào từ trước đóng vai trò quan trọng trong việc mã hóa các đặc tính này hơn là nhiệm vụ huấn luyện, nhấn mạnh tầm quan trọng của sự kiểm soát cẩn thận khi thiết kế các thí nghiệm thăm dò. Cuối cùng, nhờ một loạt các công việc tổng hợp được kiểm soát, chúng tôi chứng minh các mô hình có thể mã hóa các đặc tính này vượt quá khả năng ngẫu nhiên, ngay cả khi được phân phối trong dữ liệu như nhiễu ngẫu nhiên, đặt câu hỏi về việc khai thác các yêu cầu tuyệt đối.', 'hr': 'Iako su neuronski modeli postigli impresivne rezultate na nekoliko kriterija NLP-a, malo je shvaćeno o mehanizmima koje koriste za izvršavanje jezičkih zadataka. Stoga je mnogo nedavne pažnje posvećena analiziranju predstavljanja rečenice koje su naučili neuralni koderi kroz lense zadataka "proba". Međutim, u kojoj mjeri je informacija kodirana u predstavljanju rečenica, otkrivena kroz sondu, koja je zapravo koristila model kako bi izvršila svoj zadatak? U ovom poslu, pregledamo ovu paradigmu ispitivanja na slučaju ispitivanja prirodnog jezika, pokazujući da modeli mogu naučiti kodiranje jezičkih vlasništva čak i ako nisu potrebni za zadatak na kojem je model obučen. I dalje identificiramo da uključene riječi imaju značajnu ulogu u kodiranju tih vlasništva umjesto samog zadatka obuke, naglašavajući važnost pažljivih kontrola kada dizajniraju eksperimente za istraživanje. Konačno, putem niza kontroliranih sintetičkih zadataka, pokazujemo da modeli mogu kodirati te imovine značajno iznad nivoa šanse, čak i kada se raspodijelili u podacima kao slučajnu buku, uvjeravajući u pitanje interpretaciju apsolutnih tvrdnja o ispitivanju zadataka.', 'da': "Selvom neurale modeller har opnået imponerende resultater på flere NLP benchmarks, forstås der ikke meget om de mekanismer, de bruger til at udføre sprogopgaver. Derfor er meget opmærksomhed for nylig blevet brugt på at analysere de sætningsrepræsentationer, der er lært af neurale kodere, gennem linsen af `sonding'-opgaver. Men i hvilket omfang blev oplysningerne kodet i sætningsrepræsentationer, som opdaget gennem en sonde, faktisk brugt af modellen til at udføre sin opgave? I dette arbejde undersøger vi dette probing paradigme gennem et casestudie i Natural Language Inference, der viser, at modeller kan lære at kode sproglige egenskaber, selvom de ikke er nødvendige for den opgave, modellen blev trænet på. Vi identificerer endvidere, at forudtrænede ordindlejringer spiller en betydelig rolle i kodningen af disse egenskaber snarere end selve træningsopgaven, hvilket fremhæver vigtigheden af omhyggelige kontroller, når der designes sondeeksperimenter. Endelig demonstrerer vi gennem et sæt kontrollerede syntetiske opgaver, at modeller kan kode disse egenskaber betydeligt over tilfældighedsniveau, selv når de distribueres i dataene som tilfældig støj, hvilket sætter spørgsmålstegn ved fortolkningen af absolutte krav på sondeopgaver.", 'nl': "Hoewel neurale modellen indrukwekkende resultaten hebben behaald op verschillende NLP benchmarks, wordt weinig begrepen over de mechanismen die ze gebruiken om taaltaken uit te voeren. Zo is er veel recente aandacht besteed aan het analyseren van de zinsrepresentaties die door neurale encoders zijn geleerd, door de lens van 'tastende' taken. Maar in hoeverre werd de informatie gecodeerd in zinsrepresentaties, zoals ontdekt door een sonde, daadwerkelijk gebruikt door het model om zijn taak uit te voeren? In dit werk onderzoeken we dit proberende paradigma aan de hand van een case study in Natural Language Inference, waaruit blijkt dat modellen kunnen leren linguïstische eigenschappen te coderen, zelfs als ze niet nodig zijn voor de taak waarop het model is getraind. We identificeren verder dat vooraf getrainde woord embeddings een belangrijke rol spelen in het coderen van deze eigenschappen in plaats van de trainingstaak zelf, en benadrukken het belang van zorgvuldige controles bij het ontwerpen van sonde experimenten. Tot slot demonstreren we door middel van een reeks gecontroleerde synthetische taken dat modellen deze eigenschappen aanzienlijk boven het kansniveau kunnen coderen, zelfs wanneer ze in de gegevens worden verspreid als willekeurige ruis, waardoor de interpretatie van absolute claims op sondetaken in twijfel wordt getrokken.", 'bg': 'Въпреки че невралните модели са постигнали впечатляващи резултати по няколко показатели за НЛП, малко се разбира за механизмите, които използват за изпълнение на езикови задачи. По този начин много скорошно внимание е посветено на анализирането на репрезентациите на изреченията, научени от невронните кодери, чрез обектива на задачите "сондиране". До каква степен обаче информацията, кодирана в репрезентации на изречения, открита чрез сонда, всъщност е използвана от модела за изпълнение на задачата си? В тази работа изследваме тази сондираща парадигма чрез казус в Естествения език, показвайки, че моделите могат да се научат да кодират лингвистични свойства, дори и да не са необходими за задачата, по която моделът е обучен. Освен това идентифицираме, че предварително тренираните вграждания на думи играят значителна роля в кодирането на тези свойства, а не в самата задача за обучение, подчертавайки важността на внимателния контрол при проектирането на сондиращи експерименти. И накрая, чрез набор от контролирани синтетични задачи, демонстрираме, че моделите могат да кодират тези свойства значително над случайното ниво, дори когато са разпределени в данните като случаен шум, поставяйки под въпрос интерпретацията на абсолютни претенции за задачите по сондиране.', 'id': "Meskipun model saraf telah mencapai hasil yang mengesankan pada beberapa benchmark NLP, sedikit dipahami tentang mekanisme yang mereka gunakan untuk melakukan tugas bahasa. Jadi, banyak perhatian baru-baru ini telah didedikasikan untuk menganalisis representation kalimat yang dipelajari oleh pengekode saraf, melalui lensa dari tugas 'probing'. Namun, seberapa jauh informasi yang dikodifikasikan dalam representation kalimat, seperti ditemukan melalui sonda, sebenarnya digunakan oleh model untuk melakukan tugasnya? Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami memeriksa paradigm a penyelidikan ini melalui studi kasus di Bahasa Alami Inferensi, menunjukkan bahwa model dapat belajar untuk mengkode properti bahasa bahkan jika mereka tidak diperlukan untuk tugas di mana model dilatih. Kami lebih lanjut mengidentifikasi bahwa pembangunan kata-kata terlatih bermain peran yang konsiderer dalam pengekodan properti-properti ini daripada tugas pelatihan sendiri, menyatakan penting kontrol berhati-hati ketika merancang percobaan penyelidikan. Akhirnya, melalui set tugas sintetis yang dikendalikan, kami menunjukkan model dapat mengkode properti-properti ini jauh di atas tahap kesempatan, bahkan ketika didistribusikan dalam data sebagai suara acak, mempertanyakan interpretasi klaim mutlak tentang tugas penyelidikan.", 'de': 'Obwohl neuronale Modelle beeindruckende Ergebnisse auf mehreren NLP-Benchmarks erzielt haben, ist wenig über die Mechanismen, die sie verwenden, um Sprachaufgaben auszuführen, verstanden. So wurde in jüngster Zeit viel Aufmerksamkeit der Analyse der Satzdarstellungen gewidmet, die von neuronalen Encodern gelernt werden, durch die Linse von "Sondierungsaufgaben". Inwieweit wurde die durch eine Sonde entdeckte Information in Satzdarstellungen jedoch tatsächlich von dem Modell zur Erfüllung seiner Aufgabe genutzt? In dieser Arbeit untersuchen wir dieses Probing-Paradigma anhand einer Fallstudie in Natural Language Inference, die zeigt, dass Modelle lernen können, linguistische Eigenschaften zu kodieren, auch wenn sie für die Aufgabe, auf der das Modell trainiert wurde, nicht benötigt werden. Weiterhin zeigen wir, dass vortrainierte Worteinbettungen eine bedeutende Rolle bei der Kodierung dieser Eigenschaften spielen und nicht bei der Trainingsaufgabe selbst. Dies unterstreicht die Bedeutung sorgfältiger Kontrollen bei der Konzeption von Sondierungsexperimenten. Schließlich zeigen wir anhand einer Reihe von kontrollierten synthetischen Tasks, dass Modelle diese Eigenschaften deutlich über dem Zufallsniveau kodieren können, selbst wenn sie in den Daten als zufälliges Rauschen verteilt sind, was die Interpretation absoluter Ansprüche auf Sondierungsaufgaben in Frage stellt.', 'ko': "비록 신경모형은 몇 개의 NLP 기준 테스트에서 인상적인 결과를 얻었지만, 사람들은 그들이 언어 임무를 수행하는 메커니즘에 대해 아는 것이 매우 적다.이 때문에 최근의 많은 관심은'탐지'임무를 통해 신경 인코더가 학습한 문장 표징을 분석하는 데 집중되고 있다.그러나 탐침을 통해 발견된 문장 표징에서 인코딩된 정보는 어느 정도에 모델이 실제 임무를 수행하는 데 사용됩니까?이 작업에서 우리는 자연 언어 추리 중의 한 사례 연구를 통해 이러한 탐색 모델을 검증함으로써 모델이 인코딩 언어 속성을 학습할 수 있음을 나타낸다. 설령 그것이 모델을 훈련하는 임무에 사용되지 않더라도.우리는 사전에 훈련된 단어가 훈련 임무 자체에 삽입되는 것이 아니라 이러한 속성을 인코딩하는 데 상당한 역할을 한다는 것을 발견하고 디자인 탐지 실험을 할 때 세심하게 제어하는 중요성을 강조했다.마지막으로 통제된 합성 임무를 통해 우리는 모델이 이러한 속성을 확률 수준보다 크게 인코딩할 수 있음을 증명했다. 설령 그들이 무작위 소음으로 데이터에 분포된다 하더라도 탐지 임무의 절대적인 주장에 대한 해석에 의문을 제기할 것이다.", 'tr': 'NLP netijesinde nähili nuýral modelleri täsirli netijesini ýetip bilýän bolsa, dil işini ýetirmek üçin ullanýan mekanizmalary barada azajyk düşünýär. Şol sebäpli soňky wagtlar "probing" işleriniň lensleri bilen öwrenen sözleriň temsillerini çözmek üçin üns berildi. Ýöne, sözle suratlarynda kodlanýan maglumat, sanat tarapyndan keşif edildi. Aslynda bu nusga tarapyndan işini ýetirmek üçin ullanýardy. Bu işde, biz bu testiň paradigmanyny tebigy dil gürrüňünde bir ýagdaý barlap deňleýäris. Modeller lingwistiki häsiýetlerini kodlamaga öwrenip bilerler. Hatda nusga üçin gerekli däldir. Biz öňünden öňünden geçen sözler içinde bu häsiýetleri kodlamak üçin özüni bilim görevini ýerine örän möhüm rol oýnaýarlar, deneyleri tasarlanýanda ünsli kontrolleriň wajyplygyny ýagtylaýarys. Soňunda, kontrol edilen syntetik zadalar bilen, modelleriň bu häsiýetleri şansly derejesinden üstünde kodlayabileceğini görkezip otyrýarys. Hatta berüvlerde rastgelen ses häsiýetlere daýlanynda hem bu häsiýetleri barlamaga karar bermek üçin, netijeli soraglaryň terjimesini çykyp bermek üçin synany', 'af': "Alhoewel neurale modelles inpresieële resultate op verskeie NLP benchmarke bereik het, word klein verstaan oor die mekanisme wat hulle gebruik het om taal opdragte te doen. So, baie nuutste aandag is geantwoord om die voorstellings wat deur neurale koders geleer word te analyseer deur die lense van 'probing' taak. Maar tot watter uitbreiding was die inligting gekodeer in sin voorstellings, soos deur 'n probe ontdek is, wat eintlik deur die model gebruik word om sy taak te doen? In hierdie werk, ons ondersoek hierdie probeer paradigme deur 'n geval studie in Natuurlike Taal Inferensie, wys dat modele kan leer om lingwisiese eienskappe te kodeer selfs as hulle nie benodig is vir die taak waarop die model onderwerp is nie. Ons identifiseer verder dat voorafgeëerde woord inbêdings 'n aansienlike rol speel in kodering hierdie eienskappe eerder as die onderwerp opdrag self, verlig die belangrikheid van versigtige kontroles wanneer probeer eksperimente ontwerp word. Eindelik, deur 'n stel van kontroleerde sintetiese opdragte, kan ons model hierdie eienskappe aansien betekenlik bo-kans-vlak kodeer, selfs wanneer in die data as willekeurige ruis versprei word, aanroep ons na vraag die uitlegging van absolutiese aandrukkings op probeer opdragte.", 'fa': 'اگرچه مدل عصبی به نتیجه\u200cهای تاثیر\u200cپذیر بر چند برچسب NLP رسیده است، کمی درباره\u200cی مکانیسم\u200cهایی که برای انجام کار زبانی استفاده می\u200cکنند درک نمی\u200cشود. بنابراین، توجه خیلی اخیر برای تحلیل کردن نمایش\u200cهای جمله\u200cای که توسط رمز\u200cکنندگان عصبی یاد گرفته\u200cاند، از طریق لینک\u200cهای کار «تحقیق» استفاده شده است. با این حال، به چه اندازه اطلاعات در نمایش\u200cهای جمله\u200cها، همانطور که از طریق یک امتحان کشف شده، در واقع توسط مدل برای انجام کار آن استفاده می\u200cشود؟ در این کار، ما این پارادیگ تحقیق را از طریق یک مطالعه پرونده در تغییر زبان طبیعی تحقیق می کنیم، که نشان می دهیم که مدلها می توانند ویژگی زبان\u200cشناسی را یاد بگیرند، حتی اگر آنها نیازی ندارند برای وظیفه که مدل آموزش داده شده است. ما بیشتر مشخص می\u200cکنیم که ابتدایی کلمه\u200cهای پیش\u200cپوشیده\u200cشده در رمزبندی این ویژه\u200cها نقش بسیار بزرگی را در جای خودش کار آموزش می\u200cکنند، و زمانی طراحی آزمایش\u200cهای تحقیقات مهم کنترل\u200cهای مراقبت را مشخص می\u200cکنیم. بالاخره، از طریق یک مجموعه از کارهای سینتاتیک کنترل می\u200cکنیم که مدل\u200cها می\u200cتوانند این ویژگی\u200cها را بسیار بالاتر از سطح شانس کودک کنند، حتی هنگامی که در داده\u200cها به عنوان صدای تصادفی تقسیم می\u200cشوند، در مورد تعبیر مطلق ادعا در مورد تحقیق کار\u200cها به', 'am': 'የናቡር ዓይነቶች ምንም እንኳ በብዙ NLP የbenchmark ውጤቶች አግኝተዋል፡፡ ስለዚህም፣ በቅርብ ዘመን በ ‹መግለጽ› ስራዎችን በሚያስተማሩ የጽሑፉን መልዕክቶች በማስተዋል ተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የዝርዝር መልዕክት በምን ደረጃ ላይ ሆኖ በመፈተናው የተገኘ፣ በሞዴል ስራውን ለመፈጸም የሚጠቀም? በዚህ ስራ፣ ይህንን መግለጫ በናዳርዓዊ ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ የንግግር አካባቢዎች የስርዓት አካባቢዎች ለራሱ ከመክፈት የበለጠ ክፍል የሚያደርጉትን እናውቃለን፡፡ በመጨረሻም፣ በተወሰነ ስራዎችን በተቆጣጠረ ማድረግ፣ ሞዴላዎችን በአስቸጋሪ ደረጃ ላይ ይክድ ዘንድ የሚችሉትን እናስታውቃለን፤ ዳራዎችን በተከፋፈለ ድምፅ ሲሆን እንኳ በአካባቢ ድምፅ ላይ በተለየን እና በሥርዓት ላይ የሙሉ ጥያቄዎችን ለመፍጠር እንጠይቃለን፡፡', 'sw': 'Although neural models have achieved impressive results on several NLP benchmarks, little is understood about the mechanisms they use to perform language tasks.  Kwa hiyo, mitazamo ya hivi karibuni imekuwa ikitumia uchambuzi wa uwakilishi wa hukumu waliojifunza na idadi za ubongo, kupitia mistari ya ‘kuchunguza’ kazi. Hata hivyo, kwa kiwango gani taarifa zilikuwa imewekwa katika uwakilishi wa hukumu, kama ilivyogunduliwa kupitia mtihani, kwa kweli imetumiwa na muundo ili kufanya kazi yake? Katika kazi hii, tunachunguza mchanganyiko huu kupitia utafiti wa kesi katika Udhibiti wa lugha ya asili, tukionyesha kuwa miundo mbinu wanaweza kujifunza kuingiza utafiti wa lugha hata kama hawana haja kwa kazi ambayo model ilifundishwa. Tunagundua zaidi kuwa maneno yanayotangaza yanacheza jukumu kubwa katika kuingia utajiri huu badala ya jukumu la mafunzo wenyewe, tunaonyesha umuhimu wa udhibiti wa tahadhari wakati wa kutengeneza majaribio. Hatimaye, kupitia mazingira mengi yanayodhibitiwa, tunaonyesha mifano inaweza kuweka taarifa hizi kwa kiasi kikubwa zaidi ya kiwango cha fursa, hata kama ilivyosambazwa katika taarifa kama sauti isiyo na kawaida, wakitoa wito wa tafsiri ya madai kamili kuhusu kazi za kuthibitisha.', 'az': 'NLP benchmarklarında nöral modellərin etkileyici sonuçlarını başa çatdığı halda, dil işləri yerinə yetirmək üçün istifadə etdikləri mehanizmilər haqqında az anlaşılır. Beləliklə, çox yeni məlumat nöral kodlayıcılar tarafından öyrəndiyi cümlələri analizə verilmişdir. Lakin, cümlələrdə kodlanmış məlumat nə qədər idi ki, sonda keşfedilmiş kimi, modeli onun işini yerinə yetirmək üçün istifadə edilmişdir? Bu işdə, biz bu sınama paradigmini təbiətli Dil Inference tərzində təhsil etdik, modellərin dil özelliklərini kodlamağı öyrənə biləcəyini göstərdik, çünki modellərin təhsil olunduğu iş üçün ehtiyacı yoxdur. Biz daha da belə tanıyırıq ki, bu xüsusiyyətlərin kodlaması yerinə təhsil işlərinin özünün kodlaması üçün çox möhkəm rol oynadır, təhsil işlərini təhsil etdikdə təhsil etmək üçün təhlükəsizlik kontrollərin möhkəmliyini işıqlandırır. Sonunda, müəyyən edilmiş sintetik işləri ilə modellərin bu xüsusiyyətləri şanslıq seviyesindən çox üstün kodlaya biləcəyini göstərdik, hətta məlumatlarda rastgele səs kimi dağılıb, sonlandırma işləri barəsindəki absolut iddiaların yorumluluğunu soruşmağa başladıq.', 'hy': 'Չնայած, որ նյարդային մոդելները բազմաթիվ ՆԼՊ հարաբերականների վրա տպավորիչ արդյունքներ են ստացել, քիչ է հասկանում այն մեխանիզմների մասին, որոնք նրանք օգտագործում են լեզվի առաջադրանքների կատարման համար: Այսպիսով, վերջերս շատ ուշադրություն է դարձել նախադասությունների ներկայացումների վերլուծությանը, որոնք սովորել են նյարդային կոդերների միջոցով, «ուսումնասիրելու» խնդիրների ոսպնյակի միջոցով: Այնուամենայնիվ, ի՞նչ չափով էր նախադասությունների ներկայացումներում կոդավորված տեղեկատվությունը, ինչպես հայտնաբերվել է Sonde-ի միջոցով, իրականում օգտագործվել է մոդելի կողմից իր առաջադրանքի կատարման համար: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք այս ուսումնասիրությունը բնական լեզվի ինֆերանսի դեպքերի ուսումնասիրության միջոցով, ցույց տալով, որ մոդելները կարող են սովորել կոդավորել լեզվական հատկությունները, նույնիսկ եթե դրանք անհրաժեշտ չեն այն խնդիրը, որի Մենք նաև հայտնաբերում ենք, որ նախօրինակված բառերի ներգրավումները նշանակալի դեր են խաղում այս հատկությունները կոդավորելու մեջ, ոչ թե ինքն ուսուցման խնդրի մեջ, նշելով ուշադիր կառավարման կարևորությունը փորձարկումների ուսումնասիրու Վերջապես, վերահսկվող սինթետիկ խնդիրների մի շարք միջոցով մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մոդելները կարող են կոդավորել այս հատկությունները շատ ավելի բարձր, քան պատահական մակարդակը, նույնիսկ երբ դրանք տարածվում են տվյալներում որպես պատահական աղմուկ, որն անկասկած է վերլուծում բացարձակ', 'bn': 'যদিও নিউরেল মডেল বেশ কয়েকটি এনএলপি বেনম্যাক্কের উপর চমৎকার ফলাফল অর্জন করেছে, তবে ভাষার কাজ করার জন্য তারা ব্যবহার করে কিছু বুঝতে পারে  সাম্প্রতিক কাজের মাধ্যমে নিউরেল এনকোডার দ্বারা শিক্ষা প্রতিনিধিদের প্রতিনিধিদের বিশ্লেষণের জন্য বিশ্লেষণ করা হয়েছে। তবে কি পর্যায়ের প্রতিনিধিত্বে তথ্য এনকোড করা হয়েছে, যেমনটা প্রক্রিয়ার মাধ্যমে আবিষ্কার করা হয়েছে, তার কাজ করার জন্য মডেল ব্যবহা In this work, we examine this probing paradigm through a case study in Natural Language Inference, showing that models can learn to encode linguistic properties even if they are not needed for the task on which the model was trained.  আমরা আরো চিহ্নিত করি যে প্রশিক্ষণের পরিকল্পনার পরিকল্পনা করার পরিবর্তে এই বৈশিষ্ট্য এনকোড করার জন্য বিশেষ ভূমিকা প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে। শেষ পর্যন্ত, নিয়ন্ত্রিত সিন্টেটিক কাজের মাধ্যমে আমরা প্রদর্শন করি এই বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্য সুযোগ-স্তরের চেয়ে বেশী কোডের মাধ্যমে প্রদর্শন করি, এমনকি যখন তথ্যে বি', 'bs': 'Iako su neuronski modeli postigli impresivne rezultate na nekoliko kriterija NLP-a, malo je razumjelo o mehanizmima koje koriste za izvršavanje jezičkih zadataka. Stoga je mnogo nedavne pažnje posvećena analiziranju predstava rečenice koje su naučili neuralni koderi kroz lense zadataka "proba". Međutim, u kolikoj mjeri je informacija kodirana u predstavljanju rečenica, otkrivena kroz sondu, koja je zapravo koristila model kako bi izvršila svoj zadatak? U ovom poslu, pregledamo ovu paradigmu ispitivanja na slučaju istraživanja prirodnog jezika, pokazujući da modeli mogu naučiti kodiranje jezičkih vlasništva čak i ako nisu potrebni za zadatak na kojem je model obučen. I dalje identificiramo da uključene riječi imaju značajnu ulogu u kodiranju tih vlasništva umjesto samog zadatka obuke, naglašavajući važnost pažljivih kontrola kada dizajniraju eksperimente za istraživanje. Konačno, putem set a kontroliranih sintetičkih zadataka, pokazujemo da modeli mogu kodirati te imovine značajno iznad nivoa šanse, čak i kada se raspodijele u podacima kao nasumična buka, pozivajući u pitanje interpretaciju apsolutne tvrdnje o ispitivanju zadataka.', 'sq': "Megjithëse modelet neuronale kanë arritur rezultate mbresëlënëse në disa standarte NLP, pak kuptohet rreth mekanizmave që përdorin për të kryer detyrat gjuhësore. Kështu, vëmendja e kohëve të fundit është përkushtuar për analizimin e përfaqësimeve të fjalëve të mësuara nga koduesit nervorë, nëpërmjet lentës së detyrave `probing'. Megjithatë, në çfarë shkalle ishte informacioni i koduar në përfaqësimet e fjalëve, siç zbuluan nëpërmjet një sonde, në fakt përdorur nga modeli për të kryer detyrën e tij? In this work, we examine this probing paradigm through a case study in Natural Language Inference, showing that models can learn to encode linguistic properties even if they are not needed for the task on which the model was trained.  Ne identifikojmë më tej se përfshirjet e fjalëve të parastërvitura luajnë një rol të konsiderueshëm në kodimin e këtyre pronave në vend të detyrës së stërvitjes vetë, duke theksuar rëndësinë e kontrollit të kujdesshëm kur dizajnojnë eksperimente sondazhi. Më në fund, nëpërmjet një sëre detyrash sintetike të kontrolluara, ne demonstrojmë se modelet mund të kodojnë këto pronësi konsiderueshëm mbi nivelin e rastit, edhe kur të shpërndahen në të dhëna si zhurmë të rastësishme, duke vënë në dyshim interpretimin e pretendimeve absolute mbi detyrat e hetimit.", 'ca': "Malgrat que els models neuronals han aconseguit resultats impressionants en diversos punts de referència de la NLP, poc s'entend sobre els mecanismes que utilitzen per a fer tasques lingüístices. Així doncs, molta atenció recent s'ha dedicat a analitzar les representacions de frases aprengutes pels codificadors neuronals, a través de la lent de les tasques d''exploració'. Tot i així, fins a quin punt la informació codificada en representacions de frases, com es va descobrir a través d'una sonda, realment utilitzada pel model per executar la seva tasca? En aquesta feina, examinem aquest paradigm a d'investigació a través d'un estudi de cas de la Inferència de Llingua Natural, mostrant que els models poden aprendre a codificar propietats lingüístices fins i tot si no són necessàries per la tasca en la que el model va ser entrenat. Identifiquem també que les integracions de paraules pré-treinades juguen un paper considerable en codificar aquestes propietats en comptes de la tasca d'entrenament mateixa, subrayant l'importància de controls atents al dissenyar experiments de sonda. Finalment, a través d'un conjunt de tasques sintètiques controlades, demostram que els models poden codificar aquestes propietats considerablement més enllà del nivell d'atzar, fins i tot quan es distribueixen a les dades com a soroll aleatòric, posant en dubte la interpretació de reclamacions absolutes sobre tasques de sondage.", 'et': 'Kuigi närvimudelid on saavutanud muljetavaldavaid tulemusi mitmete NLP võrdlusnäitajate puhul, on vähe aru saada mehhanismidest, mida nad kasutavad keeleülesannete täitmiseks. Seega on viimasel ajal pööratud palju tähelepanu närvikodeerijate poolt õppitud lauseesituste analüüsimisele "proovimise" ülesannete läbi. Kui suures ulatuses kodeeritud teavet lauseesitustes, nagu avastati sondi kaudu, tegelikult kasutas mudel oma ülesande täitmiseks? Käesolevas töös uurime seda prooviparadigmat looduskeele järelduste juhtumiuuringu kaudu, näidates, et mudelid suudavad õppida keelelisi omadusi kodeerima isegi siis, kui neid ei ole vaja ülesandeks, milleks mudel koolitati. Lisaks tuvastame, et eeltreenitud sõnade manustamisel on nende omaduste kodeerimisel märkimisväärne roll pigem kui koolituse ülesandel, rõhutades hoolikate kontrollide tähtsust proovikatsete kujundamisel. Lõpuks näitame kontrollitud sünteetiliste ülesannete kogumi kaudu, et mudelid suudavad neid omadusi märkimisväärselt kõrgemal juhustasemel kodeerida isegi juhusliku mürana jaotumisel andmetes, seades kahtluse alla absoluutsete väidete tõlgendamise prooviülesannete kohta.', 'fi': "Vaikka neuromallit ovat saavuttaneet vaikuttavia tuloksia useissa NLP-vertailuarvoissa, niiden käyttämistä mekanismeista kielitehtävien suorittamiseen ei juurikaan ymmärretä. Niinpä viime aikoina on kiinnitetty paljon huomiota neurokoodereiden oppimien lauseesitteiden analysointiin `luotaustehtävien' avulla. Mutta missä määrin lauseesityksiin koodattua tietoa, kuten luotaimen avulla löydettiin, käytettiin todellisuudessa mallin tehtävän suorittamiseen? Tässä työssä tarkastelemme tätä luotausprojektia Natural Language Inference -tutkielman tapaustutkimuksen avulla, jossa osoitetaan, että mallit voivat oppia koodaamaan kielellisiä ominaisuuksia, vaikka niitä ei tarvittaisi siihen tehtävään, johon malli on koulutettu. Havaitsemme lisäksi, että esikäsiteltyillä sanaupotuksilla on merkittävä rooli näiden ominaisuuksien koodauksessa eikä itse harjoitustehtävässä, mikä korostaa huolellisten kontrollien merkitystä luotauskokeilujen suunnittelussa. Lopuksi, kontrolloitujen synteettisten tehtävien avulla osoitetaan, että mallit pystyvät koodaamaan nämä ominaisuudet huomattavasti sattumanvaraisen tason yläpuolella, vaikka ne jakautuisivat dataan sattumanvaraisena kohinana, mikä asettaa kyseenalaiseksi luotaustehtävien absoluuttisten väitteiden tulkinnan.", 'cs': 'Ačkoli neuronové modely dosáhly působivých výsledků na několika NLP benchmarkech, o mechanismech, které používají k provádění jazykových úkolů, je málo pochopeno. Proto je v poslední době věnována analýze reprezentací vět naučených neuronovými kodéry pomocí objektivu sondovacích úloh. Do jaké míry však byly informace zakódovány ve větových reprezentacích, zjištěné pomocí sondy, skutečně použity modelem k plnění svého úkolu? V této práci zkoumáme toto sondační paradigma prostřednictvím případové studie v Natural Language Inference, která ukazuje, že modely se mohou naučit kódovat jazykové vlastnosti, i když nejsou potřebné pro úkol, na kterém byl model trénován. Dále identifikujeme, že předtrénované vložení slov hrají významnou roli v kódování těchto vlastností spíše než samotné tréninkové úlohy, což zdůrazňuje důležitost pečlivých kontrol při navrhování sondovacích experimentů. Nakonec prostřednictvím sady kontrolovaných syntetických úloh ukazujeme, že modely dokážou tyto vlastnosti kódovat výrazně nad úroveň náhody, i když jsou v datech distribuovány jako náhodný šum, což zpochybňuje interpretaci absolutních nároků na sondovací úlohy.', 'ha': "Ingawa da misalin neural sun sami matsalar mai kyau a kan wasu mistakardar NLP, sai an fahimta kaɗan game da mashinaikin da suke amfani da su ga tafiyar da aikin harshen. Daga haka, ana kiyãye wa masu ƙari zuwa an yi analyza masu gaya da aka sanar da shi na kode-neural, a cikin aikin `jarraba'. Amma, ko da yaki aka kodi information cikin shaidar a cewa, kamar an gane shi a cikin wani jarraba, an yi amfani da misalin ya yi amfani da shi ga ya cika aikinsa? Daga wannan aikin, Munã jarraba wannan fanati a bayan wani fassara a cikin Lugha Kizartar da Natural, kuma Munã nũna wa misãlai za su iya karanta kayan-koda properties wa linguistic, kuma kõ dã ba su ƙayyade shi ba ga aikin da aka sanar da shi misalin. Tuna ƙara gane cewa a baka kalmar da aka fito da su yi wani roli mai girma a kodi wannan properties musamman wa aikin na lafiyar da shi, kuma ya yanyanke muhimu ga masu tsari idan an sami jarrabãwa. Haƙĩƙa, a ƙarami, cikin wasu aikin da aka yi controlled, muna nuna misãlai masu iya kodi waɗannan properties kan babba a kan-daraja, kuma kõ dã idan an raba cikin data kamar sauti wanda ya yi rabo, yana tambaya fassarar fassarar daidaita masu cikin aikin da za'a jarraba.", 'he': 'למרות שהמודלים העצביים השיגו תוצאות מרשים על מספר נקודות רמז NLP, מעט מובנים על המגנונים שהם משתמשים בהם כדי לבצע משימות שפה. לכן, תשומת לב לאחרונה רבה הוקדשה לניתוח מייצגי המשפט שלמדו על ידי קודדים עצביים, דרך העדשה של משימות "חקירה". בכל אופן, עד כמה המידע היה מוצפן ביציגות משפטים, כפי שנגלה דרך חוקר, למעשה השתמש על ידי המודל כדי לבצע את המשימה שלו? בעבודה הזו, אנו בודקים את הפרדיגמה הזו של חקירה דרך מחקר מקרים באינפרנציה של שפת טבעית, שמראה שמודלים יכולים ללמוד לקוד תכונות שפתיות אפילו אם הם לא נזדקקים למשימה שבה המודל הוכשר. אנו מזהה יותר כי קישורים מילים מלפני אימון משחקים תפקיד משמעותי בקוד הנכונות הללו במקום המשימה האימונית עצמה, להדגיש את חשיבות שליטות זהירות בעיצוב ניסויים. סוף סוף, באמצעות קבוצה של משימות סינטטיות שולטות, אנחנו מראים דוגמנים יכולים לקוד את התכונות הללו הרבה מעל רמת סיכוי, אפילו כשהם מתפזרים במידע כרעש אקראי, מפקפקים את הפרשנות של טענות מוחלטות על משימות חקירה.', 'sk': "Čeprav so nevronski modeli dosegli impresivne rezultate na več referenčnih vrednostih NLP, je malo razumljeno o mehanizmih, ki jih uporabljajo za izvajanje jezikovnih nalog. Tako je bilo v zadnjem času posvečeno veliko pozornosti analizi stavkov, ki jih naučijo nevronski kodirniki, skozi objektivo nalog `sondiranja'. Vendar, v kolikšni meri so bile informacije kodirane v stavkovnih reprezentacijah, kot so bile odkrite skozi sondo, dejansko uporabljene s strani modela za opravljanje svoje naloge? V tem delu preučujemo to merilno paradigmo skozi študijo primera v sklepanju naravnega jezika, ki pokaže, da se modeli lahko naučijo kodirati jezikovne lastnosti, tudi če niso potrebne za nalogo, na kateri je bil model usposobljen. Nadalje ugotavljamo, da imajo predtrenirane besede pomembno vlogo pri kodiranju teh lastnosti in ne pri sami nalogi usposabljanja, kar poudarja pomen skrbnega nadzora pri oblikovanju poskusov sondiranja. Nazadnje, skozi nabor kontroliranih sintetičnih nalog, dokazujemo, da lahko modeli te lastnosti kodirajo precej nad naključnim nivojem, tudi če so v podatkih porazdeljeni kot naključni hrup, kar postavlja pod vprašaj interpretacijo absolutnih trditev o opravilih sondiranja.", 'bo': 'རྒྱ་ནག་མིག་དཔེ་གཞུང་གིས་NLP(benchmarks)རྗེས་སུ་འབྱུང་བའི་གནད་ཅིག་ཡིན་ནའང་། ཁོང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ དེར་བརྟེན། ཉེ་ཆར་བྱུང་བའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིན་པའི་སྒྲ་ཚིགས་ཀྱི་གསལ་བཤད་པ་ཚོར་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱས་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། ཚིག་གི་གསལ་བཤད་ནང་དུ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་གང་རིང་ཞིག་བྱུང་བ་རེད། ལྟ་བ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ངེད་ཚོའི་རྣམ་པ་ལྟར་ཞིབ་བྱས་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་ན། We further identify that pretrained word embeddings play a considerable role in encoding these properties rather than the training task itself, highlighting the importance of careful control when designing probing experiments. Finally, through a set of controlled synthetic tasks, we demonstrate models can encode these properties considerably above chance-level, even when distributed in the data as random noise, calling into question the interpretation of absolute claims on probing tasks.', 'jv': 'Mangkin ajeng-ajeng langkung model sing arep akeh banjur dadi kapan banget NLP, dadi piye isih luwih apik perusahaan manukasi sing nggawe nguasai perusahaan banget. Kowe kudu, akeh pengguna diandelok kanggo ngerasakno nggo ngerasakno pawaran kelangan seneng nggawe barang Neral Nanging, segala pirang-pirang mbukak informasi kode kanggo kelas nang wateréngan ingkang dipunanggap Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné nyong bisa pasakno karo perbudhakan kanggo saben kelas nang ingkang Daerah Language Info. Awak dhéwé énong beraksi perbudhakan kelas-kelas perangkat wong liyane mungkin nggawe winih dhéwé, lan uwis kuwi nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas kontrol sing apik tur angel. Erheh, nganggo sistem sing perusahaan sistem sistem sing dadi, kéné lagi model sing bisa nguasai perusahaan karo perusahaan-perusahaan ingkang dipunahayo perusahaan-perusahaan, lho ngono nggawe daftar kang karo perusahaan sampeyan, nganggo perusahaan pangan kawit perusahaan anyar mên.'}
{'en': 'One-class Text Classification with Multi-modal Deep Support Vector Data Description', 'ar': 'تصنيف نص من فئة واحدة مع وصف بيانات متجه للدعم العميق متعدد الوسائط', 'fr': 'Classification de texte en une classe avec description de données vectorielles multimodales à support profond', 'pt': 'Classificação de texto de uma classe com descrição de dados vetoriais de suporte profundo multimodal', 'es': 'Clasificación de texto de una clase con descripción de datos vectoriales de soporte profundo multimodal', 'ja': 'マルチモーダルディープサポートベクターデータの説明付き1クラスのテキスト分類', 'zh': '多模态深度向量数据描述单类文本分', 'ru': 'Одноклассная классификация текста с мультимодальным описанием векторных данных глубокой поддержки', 'hi': 'बहु मोडल गहरी समर्थन वेक्टर डेटा विवरण के साथ एक वर्ग पाठ वर्गीकरण', 'ga': 'Aicmiú Téacs Aonchineálach le Cur síos ar Shonraí Ilmhódacha Veicteoir Tacaíochta Deep', 'ka': 'ერთ- კლასის ტექსტის კლასიფიკაცია მრავალური მდინარეობის დამხმარებელი ვექტორის მონაცემების გამოსახულება', 'el': 'Ταξινόμηση κειμένου μίας κατηγορίας με τα πολυμορφικά διανυσματικά δεδομένα βαθιάς υποστήριξης Περιγραφή', 'hu': 'Egy osztályú szövegosztályozás multimodális mély támogatással Vektoradatok Leírás', 'it': 'Classificazione del testo di una classe con supporto multiplo profondo dei dati vettoriali Descrizione', 'lt': 'Vienos klasės teksto klasifikacija su daugiarūšio giliosios paramos vektoriaus duomenų aprašymu', 'kk': 'Бір класс мәтін бірнеше модельді түсті қолдау вектордың деректерінің сипаттамасы', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Klasifikasi Teks Kelas Satu dengan Keterangan Data Vektor Sokongan Tepat Multi modal', 'ml': 'പല- മോഡോള്\u200d ആഴത്തിലെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന വെക്ടര്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ വിശദീകരണം', 'mn': 'Нэг-класс текст хэлбэртэй олон моделийн гүн гүн дэмжих векторын өгөгдлийн тодорхойлолт', 'mt': 'One-class Text Classification with Multi-modal Deep Support Vector Data Description', 'no': 'Tekstklassifikasjon med fleire modal dyppastøtte vektordata', 'sr': 'Klasifikacija teksta u jednoklasi sa multimodalnom dubokom podrškom vektorskih podataka opisa', 'pl': 'Klasyfikacja tekstu jednej klasy z multimodalnymi danymi wektorowymi głębokiego wsparcia Opis', 'ro': 'Clasificarea textului dintr-o clasă cu suport multimodal profund de date vectoriale Descriere', 'si': 'වෙක්ටර් දත්ත විස්තරය සමග ගොඩක් මෝඩාල් ගොඩක් උදව් කරන වෙක්ටර් වර්තනය', 'so': 'One-class Text Classification with Multi-modal Deep Support Vector Data Description', 'sv': 'Klass Text Klass med Multi-modal Deep Support Vektordata Beskrivning', 'ta': 'பல- மாதிரி ஆழம் ஆதரவு தரவுடன் ஒரு வகுப்பு உரை வகைப்படுத்தல்Description', 'ur': 'ایک کلاس کے متن کلاسیفٹ کے ساتھ بہت سی موڈال عمیق حمایت ویکتور ڈاٹا کا سپے', 'uz': 'Description', 'vi': 'Hạng Văn bản hạng một với mô tả trình nâng cao cấp đa phương tiện', 'bg': 'Еднокласна класификация на текста с мултимодална дълбока поддръжка на векторни данни Описание', 'hr': 'Klasifikacija teksta u jednoklasi sa multimodalnom dubokom podrškom vektorskih podataka opisa', 'nl': 'Één-klas tekstclassificatie met multimodale diepe ondersteuning vectorgegevens Beschrijving', 'da': 'En klasse tekstklassifikation med multimodal dyb understøttelse vektordata Beskrivelse', 'de': 'Eine Klasse Textklassifizierung mit multimodalen Deep Support Vektordaten Beschreibung', 'id': 'Klasifikasi Teks Satu Kelas dengan Deskripsi Data Vektor Bantuan Dalam Multi modal', 'ko': '다중모드 깊이 지원 벡터 데이터 기술 기반 텍스트 분류', 'fa': 'تنظیم متن یک کلاس با توصیف داده\u200cهای ویکتور پشتیبانی عمیق چندmodal', 'sw': 'Description', 'af': 'Een klas Teks Klassifikasie met veelvuldige modale diep ondersteun vektor data beskrywing', 'tr': 'Birnäçe modal derin Destek vektör Maglumaty Aýratmasy', 'sq': 'Klasifikimi i një klase teksti me përshkrimin e të dhënave të vectorit të mbështetjes së thellë multimodale', 'am': 'Description', 'hy': 'Մեկ դասակարգ տեքստի դասակարգ՝ բազմամոդային խորը աջակցության մեջ տեղեկատվության նկարագրության հետ', 'az': 'Birinci s톛viyy톛 Metin S캼n캼flamas캼 칂oxlu modal Deep Destek Vekt칬r Veril톛ri', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Jedna klasa klasifikacije teksta sa multimodalnom dubokom podrškom vektorskih podataka opisa', 'ca': "Classificació de text d'una classe amb descripció de dades multimodals de suport profund", 'cs': 'Klasifikace textu jedné třídy s multimodální hlubokou podporou vektorových dat Popis', 'et': 'Üheklassi teksti klassifitseerimine koos mitmeliigilise sügava toe vektoriandmetega Kirjeldus', 'fi': 'Yhden luokan tekstiluokitus multimodaalisella syvätuella Vector Data Kuvaus', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': 'Description', 'he': 'מסווג טקסט מסוג אחד עם תיאור מידע קטור תמיכה עמוקה רבה', 'sk': 'Enorazredna klasifikacija besedila z vektorskimi podpornimi vektorskimi podatki Opis', 'bo': 'རྣམ་པ་ལྡོག་གྲངས་གཅིག་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱིས་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་སྐྱོར་ཀྱི་བརྗོད་འགྲེལ་བཤད་དང་།'}
{'en': 'This work presents multi-modal deep SVDD (mSVDD) for one-class text classification. By extending the uni-modal SVDD to a multiple modal one, we build mSVDD with multiple hyperspheres, that enable us to build a much better description for target one-class data. Additionally, the end-to-end architecture of mSVDD can jointly handle neural feature learning and one-class text learning. We also introduce a mechanism for incorporating negative supervision in the absence of real negative data, which can be beneficial to the mSVDD model. We conduct experiments on Reuters and 20 Newsgroup datasets, and the experimental results demonstrate that mSVDD outperforms uni-modal SVDD and mSVDD can get further improvements when negative supervision is incorporated.', 'ar': 'يقدم هذا العمل SVDD العميق متعدد الوسائط (mSVDD) لتصنيف النص من فئة واحدة. من خلال توسيع SVDD أحادي الوسائط إلى نموذج متعدد الوسائط ، نقوم ببناء mSVDD مع العديد من الكرات الفائقة ، والتي تمكننا من بناء وصف أفضل بكثير لبيانات الفئة الواحدة المستهدفة. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، يمكن للبنية الشاملة لـ mSVDD التعامل بشكل مشترك مع تعلم الميزات العصبية وتعلم النص من فئة واحدة. نقدم أيضًا آلية لدمج الإشراف السلبي في حالة عدم وجود بيانات سلبية حقيقية ، والتي يمكن أن تكون مفيدة لنموذج mSVDD. نجري تجارب على رويترز ومجموعة بيانات 20 مجموعة أخبار ، وأظهرت النتائج التجريبية أن mSVDD يتفوق على SVDD أحادي الوسائط و mSVDD ويمكنهما الحصول على مزيد من التحسينات عند دمج الإشراف السلبي.', 'es': 'Este trabajo presenta SVDD profundo multimodal (mSVDD) para la clasificación de texto de una clase. Al extender el SVDD unimodal a uno modal múltiple, creamos MSVDD con múltiples hiperesferas, lo que nos permite crear una descripción mucho mejor para los datos objetivo de una clase. Además, la arquitectura integral de MSvDD puede gestionar conjuntamente el aprendizaje de funciones neuronales y el aprendizaje de texto de una sola clase. También introducimos un mecanismo para incorporar la supervisión negativa en ausencia de datos negativos reales, lo que puede ser beneficioso para el modelo MSvDD. Llevamos a cabo experimentos en Reuters y en 20 conjuntos de datos de grupos de noticias, y los resultados experimentales demuestran que MSVDD supera al SVDD unimodal y que mSvDD puede obtener mejoras adicionales cuando se incorpora la supervisión negativa.', 'pt': 'Este trabalho apresenta o SVDD multimodal profundo (mSVDD) para classificação de texto em uma classe. Ao estender o SVDD unimodal para um modal múltiplo, construímos o mSVDD com várias hiperesferas, que nos permitem construir uma descrição muito melhor para dados de uma classe de destino. Além disso, a arquitetura de ponta a ponta do mSVDD pode lidar em conjunto com o aprendizado de recursos neurais e o aprendizado de texto de uma classe. Também introduzimos um mecanismo para incorporar supervisão negativa na ausência de dados negativos reais, o que pode ser benéfico para o modelo mSVDD. Conduzimos experimentos em conjuntos de dados da Reuters e 20 Newsgroup, e os resultados experimentais demonstram que o mSVDD supera o SVDD unimodal e o mSVDD pode obter melhorias adicionais quando a supervisão negativa é incorporada.', 'fr': "Ce travail présente le SVDD profond multimodal (mSvDD) pour la classification de texte en une seule classe. En étendant le SVDD unimodal à un SVDD multimodal, nous créons un msVDD avec plusieurs hypersphères, ce qui nous permet de créer une bien meilleure description pour les données cibles d'une classe. De plus, l'architecture de bout en bout de MSvDD peut gérer conjointement l'apprentissage des fonctionnalités neuronales et l'apprentissage de texte en une seule classe. Nous introduisons également un mécanisme pour intégrer la surveillance négative en l'absence de données négatives réelles, ce qui peut être bénéfique pour le modèle mSvDD. Nous menons des expériences sur Reuters et 20 jeux de données de Newsgroups, et les résultats expérimentaux démontrent que le mSvDD surpasse le SVDD unimodal et que le mSvDD peut obtenir de nouvelles améliorations lorsqu'une supervision négative est incorporée.", 'ja': '本作は、1クラスのテキスト分類のためのマルチモーダルディープSVDD (mSVDD)を提示している。単一モーダルSVDDを複数のモーダルワンに拡張することで、複数のハイパースフェアを備えたmSVDDを構築し、ターゲットワンクラスのデータの記述をはるかに改善することができます。さらに、mSVDDのエンドツーエンドのアーキテクチャは、ニューラルフィーチャー学習と1クラスのテキスト学習を共同で処理することができます。また、実陰性データがない場合に陰性監視を取り入れる仕組みも導入しており、mSVDDモデルにとって有益である。ロイターとニュースグループデータセット20個の実験を行い、実験結果は、mSVDDが単一モーダルSVDDを上回り、mSVDDが陰性監視を取り入れた場合にさらなる改善を得ることができることを実証している。', 'zh': '事具单类文本多模态深度SVDD(mSVDD)。 因将单模态 SVDD 广至多模态 SVDD,构多超球体之 mSVDD,使我得为的单类数事。 此外,mSVDD之端到端架构可共处神经特徵学单类文本。 引入无实负数,入负监之机,利于mSVDD形。 路透社、20新闻组数集上行实验,实验结果表明,mSVDD优于单模态SVDD,当入督负面,mSVDD可得而进也。', 'hi': 'यह काम एक-वर्ग पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए बहु-मोडल डीप एसवीडीडी (एमएसवीडीडी) प्रस्तुत करता है। एक से अधिक मोडल एक करने के लिए uni-modal SVDD का विस्तार करके, हम कई hyperspheres के साथ mSVDD का निर्माण, कि हमें लक्ष्य एक वर्ग डेटा के लिए एक बेहतर विवरण बनाने के लिए सक्षम बनाने के लिए सक्षम है। इसके अतिरिक्त, एमएसवीडीडी की एंड-टू-एंड आर्किटेक्चर संयुक्त रूप से तंत्रिका सुविधा सीखने और एक-वर्ग पाठ सीखने को संभाल सकती है। हम वास्तविक नकारात्मक डेटा की अनुपस्थिति में नकारात्मक पर्यवेक्षण को शामिल करने के लिए एक तंत्र भी पेश करते हैं, जो एमएसवीडीडी मॉडल के लिए फायदेमंद हो सकता है। हम रॉयटर्स और 20 न्यूजग्रुप डेटासेट पर प्रयोग करते हैं, और प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम दर्शाते हैं कि एमएसवीडीडी यूनि-मोडल एसवीडीडी को मात देता है और नकारात्मक पर्यवेक्षण को शामिल किए जाने पर एमएसवीडीडी को और सुधार मिल सकता है।', 'ru': 'В данной работе представлены мультимодальные глубинные SVDD (mSVDD) для одноклассовой классификации текста. Расширяя одномодальный SVDD до множественного модального, мы строим mSVDD с множественными гиперсферами, которые позволяют нам построить гораздо лучшее описание для целевых одноклассовых данных. Кроме того, сквозная архитектура mSVDD может совместно обрабатывать обучение нейронных функций и одноклассовое текстовое обучение. Мы также вводим механизм включения отрицательного надзора при отсутствии реальных отрицательных данных, который может быть полезен для модели mSVDD. Мы проводим эксперименты на наборах данных Reuters и 20 Newsgroup, и экспериментальные результаты демонстрируют, что mSVDD превосходит одномодальные SVDD и mSVDD могут получить дальнейшие улучшения, когда включен отрицательный надзор.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an saothar seo SVDD domhain ilmhódúil (mSVDD) i láthair le haghaidh aicmiú téacs aon-aicme. Tríd an SVDD uni-mhódach a leathnú go modúl iolrach, tógaimid mSVDD le hipearsféar iolrach, a chuireann ar ár gcumas cur síos i bhfad níos fearr a dhéanamh ar shonraí sprice aon-aicme. Ina theannta sin, is féidir le hailtireacht ceann go ceann mSVDD foghlaim gné néarúil agus foghlaim téacs aon-aicme a láimhseáil i gcomhpháirt. Tugaimid isteach freisin meicníocht chun maoirseacht dhiúltach a ionchorprú in éagmais fíor-shonraí diúltacha, ar féidir leis a bheith tairbheach don tsamhail mSVDD. Déanaimid turgnaimh ar thacair sonraí Reuters agus 20 Grúpa Nuachta, agus léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha go sáraíonn mSVDD SVDD aonmhódúil agus is féidir le mSVDD feabhsuithe breise a fháil nuair a dhéantar maoirseacht dhiúltach a ionchorprú.', 'ka': 'Name Uni- modal SVDD- ს მრავალური მოდეალური გაფართლებით, ჩვენ mSVDD- ს მრავალური ჰიპერსფერებით შევქმნით, რომელიც ჩვენ უფრო უკეთესი განახლება ერთ- კლასის მონაცემებისთვის. დამატებით, mSVDD- ის ბოლოდან დასრულებული არქტიქტიკური შეუძლია ერთადერთად გასწავლა ნეიროლური ფუნქციების სწავლა და ერთკლასის ტექსტის სწავლა. ჩვენ ასევე შევცვალოთ მაქანიზმი, რომელიც მSVDD მოდელისთვის გამოსაყენებელი იქნება მინდომეტური მონაცემების გამოყენება. ჩვენ როცა როვირტერისტები და 20 ნუზეგური მონაცემების შესახებ ექსპერიმენტები გავაკეთებთ, და ექსპერიმენტიური შესახებ გამოიყენება, რომ mSVDD არ მოდიალური SVDD და mSVDD შეიძლება დააკეთებ', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει πολυμορφικό βαθύ SVDD (mSVDD) για ταξινόμηση κειμένου μιας κατηγορίας. Επεκτείνοντας το μονοmodal SVDD σε ένα πολλαπλό modal, χτίζουμε το mSVDD με πολλαπλές υπερσφαιρές, που μας επιτρέπουν να οικοδομήσουμε μια πολύ καλύτερη περιγραφή για δεδομένα στόχου μιας κατηγορίας. Επιπλέον, η αρχιτεκτονική του μπορεί να χειριστεί από κοινού τη μάθηση νευρωνικών χαρακτηριστικών και την εκμάθηση κειμένου μιας τάξης. Εισάγουμε επίσης έναν μηχανισμό ενσωμάτωσης αρνητικής εποπτείας ελλείψει πραγματικών αρνητικών δεδομένων, γεγονός που μπορεί να είναι ευεργετικό για το μοντέλο mSVDD. Διεξάγουμε πειράματα σε σύνολα δεδομένων Reuters και 20 Newsgroup, και τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα καταδεικνύουν ότι το mSVDD ξεπερνά τις μονοmodale SVDD και το mSVDD μπορεί να λάβει περαιτέρω βελτιώσεις όταν ενσωματώνεται αρνητική εποπτεία.', 'hu': 'Ez a munka bemutatja a multimodális mély SVDD (mSVDD) egyosztályú szövegosztályozáshoz. Az unimodális SVDD kiterjesztésével több modális mSVDD-t építünk több hiperszférával, ami lehetővé teszi számunkra, hogy sokkal jobb leírást készítsünk az egyosztályú céladatok számára. Ezenkívül az mSVDD end-to-end architektúrája közösen kezeli az idegi funkciók tanulását és az egyosztályú szövegtanulást. Bevezetünk egy mechanizmust a negatív felügyelet beépítésére valós negatív adatok hiányában, ami előnyös lehet az mSVDD modell számára. Reuters és 20 hírcsoport adatkészleten végzünk kísérleteket, és a kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy az mSVDD felülmúlja az unimodális SVDD és az mSVDD további javulást érhet el negatív felügyelet beépítésével.', 'kk': 'Бұл жұмыс бір класс мәтін классификациясы үшін көп модалдық терең SVDD (mSVDD) дегенді көрсетеді. Бір- модалдық SVDD- ді бірнеше модельді бірнеше модельді кеңейтумен, біз mSVDD- ді бірнеше гиперсферлермен құрамыз. Бұл бір класс деректер үшін бірнеше жақсы сипаттамасын құруға мүмкін болады. МSVDD соңындағы архитектурасы невралдық мүмкіндіктерді оқыту мен бір класс мәтінді оқыту мүмкіндігін біріктіре алады. Сонымен қатар, мSVDD үлгісіне пайда болуы мүмкін, шын негативті мәліметтер жоқ дегенде негативті қарау механизмін ендіру. Біз Ройтерс және 20 жаңалық топ деректер жиындарында тәжірибелерді орындаймыз. Тәжірибе нәтижелері, mSVDD бір модалдық SVDD және mSVDD- нің негативті бақылау кезінде жақсы жақсартылып алады.', 'it': "Questo lavoro presenta SVDD profondo multimodale (mSVDD) per la classificazione di testo di una classe. Estendendo l'SVDD unimodale a uno multimodale, costruiamo mSVDD con più ipersfere, che ci consentono di costruire una descrizione molto migliore per i dati di una classe target. Inoltre, l'architettura end-to-end di mSVDD può gestire congiuntamente l'apprendimento di funzionalità neurali e l'apprendimento di testo di una classe. Introduciamo anche un meccanismo per incorporare la vigilanza negativa in assenza di dati negativi reali, che può essere vantaggioso per il modello mSVDD. Conduciamo esperimenti su Reuters e 20 dataset di Newsgroup, e i risultati sperimentali dimostrano che mSVDD supera SVDD unimodale e mSVDD può ottenere ulteriori miglioramenti quando viene incorporata la supervisione negativa.", 'mk': 'Оваа работа претставува мултимодален длабок SVDD (mSVDD) за класификација на еден клас текст. Со проширувањето на уни-модалниот SVDD на мултикален модален, ние градиме mSVDD со мултикални хиперсфери, кои ни овозможуваат да изградиме многу подобар опис за податоци од цел на една класа. Покрај тоа, архитектурата од крај до крај на mSVDD може заедно да се справи со учењето на невровните карактеристики и еднокласниот текст учење. Исто така, воведуваме механизам за вклучување на негативен надзор во отсуството на реални негативни податоци, што може да биде корисно за моделот mSVDD. Ние спроведуваме експерименти на Ројтерс и 20 новински групи податоци, и експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека mSVDD надминува унимодален SVDD и mSVDD може да добие понатамошни подобрувања кога е вклучен негативен надзор.', 'lt': 'This work presents multi-modal deep SVDD (mSVDD) for one-class text classification.  Išplėsdami vienmodalinį SVDD daugiarūšį, sukuriame mSVDD su daugiarūšiais hipersferais, kad galėtume sukurti gerokai geresnį tikslinių vienos klasės duomenų aprašymą. Be to, mSVDD pabaigos architektūra gali bendrai valdyti nervinių savybių mokymąsi ir vienos klasės teksto mokymąsi. We also introduce a mechanism for incorporating negative supervision in the absence of real negative data, which can be beneficial to the mSVDD model.  Atliekame eksperimentus su Reuters ir 20 naujienų grupių duomenų rinkiniais, o eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mSVDD rezultatai yra vienodo režimo SVDD ir mSVDD rezultatai gali būti toliau tobulinami, kai atliekama neigiama priežiūra.', 'ms': 'Kerja ini menghasilkan SVDD dalam berbilang-modal (mSVDD) untuk klasifikasi teks satu-kelas. Dengan memperluas SVDD uni modal ke satu modal berbilang, kita membina mSVDD dengan hipersfera berbilang, yang membolehkan kita membina keterangan yang jauh lebih baik untuk data sasaran satu kelas. Lagipun, arkitektur akhir-akhir mSVDD boleh bersama-sama mengendalikan pembelajaran fitur saraf dan pembelajaran teks satu kelas. Kami juga memperkenalkan mekanisme untuk memasukkan pengawasan negatif dalam ketiadaan data negatif sebenar, yang boleh berguna untuk model mSVDD. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada Reuters dan 20 set data kumpulan berita, dan hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa mSVDD melampaui prestasi SVDD dan mSVDD uni modal boleh mendapatkan peningkatan lanjut apabila pengawasan negatif disertai.', 'mt': 'This work presents multi-modal deep SVDD (mSVDD) for one-class text classification.  By extending the uni-modal SVDD to a multiple modal one, we build mSVDD with multiple hyperspheres, that enable us to build a much better description for target one-class data.  Additionally, the end-to-end architecture of mSVDD can jointly handle neural feature learning and one-class text learning.  We also introduce a mechanism for incorporating negative supervision in the absence of real negative data, which can be beneficial to the mSVDD model.  Aħna nagħmlu esperimenti fuq Reuters u 20 sett ta’ dejta ta’ Newsgroup, u r-riżultati sperimentali juru li l-mSVDD tirriżulta aħjar minn SVDD unimodali u mSVDD jistgħu jiksbu aktar titjib meta tiġi inkorporata superviżjoni negattiva.', 'ml': 'This work presents multi-modal deep SVDD (mSVDD) for one-class text classification.  By extending the uni-modal SVDD to a multiple modal one, we build mSVDD with multiple hyperspheres, that enable us to build a much better description for target one-class data.  കൂടുതലായി, എംഎസ്\u200cവിഡിയിന്റെ അവസാനത്തിലേക്ക് അവസാനിക്കുന്ന ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിക്കാനും ഒരു ക്ലാസിലെ പഠന പദാവലിയും കൈകാര് യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥത്തിലെ നെഗറ്റീവ് ഡേറ്റായില്ലാതെ നേരിട്ട് നിരീക്ഷണത്തില്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനായി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു മെക്കീനിസം പരിചയപ്പ റെയ്റ്റര്\u200dസിലും 20 ന്യൂസ് ഗ്രൂപ്പിലും നമ്മള്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു. പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു, എംഎസ്\u200cവിഡിയില്\u200d യൂണിമോഡ', 'mn': 'Энэ ажил нэг ангийнхээ хэлбэрийн олон моделийн гүн гүнзгий SVDD (mSVDD) гэдгийг харуулдаг. Uni-modal SVDD-г олон модалын нэг рүү нэмэхэд, бид mSVDD-г олон гиперфер ашиглан бүтээдэг. Энэ нь бидэнд нэг класс өгөгдлийн зорилго дээр илүү сайн тайлбарлах боломжтой. МSVDD-ын төгсгөлийн архитектур нь мэдрэлийн хувьд суралцах болон нэг ангийнхээ текст суралцах боломжтой болно. Мөн бид жинхэнэ сөрөг өгөгдлийн байхгүй байх үед сөрөг наблюдаа орлуулах механизмийг танилцуулдаг. Энэ нь mSVDD загварт ашигтай болно. Бид Ройтерс болон 20 мэдээллийн бүлгийн өгөгдлийн сан дээр туршилт хийдэг. Ингэснээр туршилтын үр дүнд mSVDD нь нэг modal SVDD болон mSVDD нь сөрөг харах үед илүү сайжруулах боломжтой болно.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă SVDD profund multimodal (mSVDD) pentru clasificarea textului de o clasă. Prin extinderea SVDD-ului unimodal la unul multimodal, construim mSVDD cu mai multe hipersfere, care ne permit să construim o descriere mult mai bună pentru datele de o clasă țintă. În plus, arhitectura end-to-end a mSVDD poate gestiona împreună învățarea caracteristicilor neurale și învățarea text de o clasă. De asemenea, introducem un mecanism de încorporare a supravegherii negative în absența datelor negative reale, care pot fi benefice modelului mSVDD. Realizăm experimente pe seturi de date Reuters și 20 de grupuri de știri, iar rezultatele experimentale demonstrează că mSVDD depășește SVDD unimodal și mSVDD pot obține îmbunătățiri suplimentare atunci când este încorporată supravegherea negativă.', 'pl': 'W pracy przedstawiono multimodalny głęboki SVDD (mSVDD) do klasyfikacji tekstu jednej klasy. Rozszerzając unimodalny SVDD na wielomodalny, budujemy mSVDD z wieloma hipersferami, które pozwalają nam zbudować znacznie lepszy opis docelowych danych jednej klasy. Ponadto kompleksowa architektura mSVDD może wspólnie obsługiwać naukę funkcji neuronowych i naukę tekstu w jednej klasie. Wprowadzamy również mechanizm włączania negatywnego nadzoru w przypadku braku rzeczywistych negatywnych danych, co może być korzystne dla modelu mSVDD. Przeprowadzamy eksperymenty na zbiorach danych Reuters i 20 Newsgroup, a wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że mSVDD przewyższa unimodalny SVDD, a mSVDD może uzyskać dalszą poprawę w przypadku włączenia negatywnego nadzoru.', 'no': 'Dette arbeidet viser fleire modal dyp SVDD (mSVDD) for ein klasse tekstklassifikasjon. Ved å utvida uni modal SVDD til ein fleire modal, bygger vi mSVDD med fleire hypersferar, som kan bruka oss å bygge mykje bedre skildring for målsdata for ein klasse. I tillegg kan mSVDD- endearkitekturen kopla handtere læring av neuralfunksjonar og ein klasse tekstlæring. Vi introduserer også ein mekanisme for å inkludere negativt oversikt i absence av verkeleg negativ data, som kan vera nyttig for mSVDD-modellen. Vi gjer eksperimenter på Reuters og 20 Newsgroup-datasett, og eksperimentelle resultaten viser at mSVDD utfører uni modal SVDD og mSVDD kan få meir forbedringar når negativt oversikt er inkludert.', 'sr': 'Ovaj rad predstavlja multimodalnu duboku SVDD (mSVDD) za klasifikaciju teksta jednoklase. Proširenjem unimodalnog SVDD-a na višestruku modalnu, izgradimo mSVDD sa višestrukim hipersferama, koji nam omogućava da izgradimo mnogo bolji opis za jednoklasne podatke mete. Dodatno, arhitektura mSVDD-a na kraju može zajedno da podnese učenje neuralnih funkcija i učenje teksta u jednoklasi. Takođe predstavljamo mehanizam za uključenje negativnog nadzora u odsustvo pravih negativnih podataka, koji može biti korisni za model mSVDD-a. Mi vodimo eksperimente na Rojtersu i 20 novinskih grupa podataka, i eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da mSVDD izvršava unimodalnu SVDD i mSVDD mogu dobiti dalje poboljšanja kada se uključuje negativna nadzor.', 'so': 'Shaqadan waxay u diyaarisaa fasalka qoraal ah oo aad u nooshahay SVDD (mSVDD). Sida aan u sii fidinno SVDD qaab kala duduwan, waxaynu dhisaynaa mSVDD oo ku yaala overffero kala duduwan, taasoo inagu caawinaya inaan dhisno tilmaamo aad u wanaagsan si aan loogu talagalay macluumaadka fasalka hal fasalka ah. Sidoo kale dhismaha ugu dambaysta ee mSVDD wuxuu si wadajir ah u qaban karaa barashada barashada neurada iyo barashada qoraalka hal fasalka ah. Sidoo kale waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa meyr aan ku qorno ilaalinta negative iyadoo aysan jirin macluumaad rasmi ah, kaas oo faa’iido u yeelan kara modelka mSVD. Waxaan sameynaa imtixaan ku saabsan Reuters iyo 20 garsoorida ee Newsgroups, resultiyada imtixaanka ayaa caddaynaya in mSVDD ka soo bixiyo u-modal SVDD iyo mSVDD waxay heli karaan hagaajin dheeraad ah marka lagu qoro ilaalinta negative.', 'si': 'Name Uni- මොඩාල් SVDD එක ගොඩක් මොඩාල් එකක් වෙනුවෙන්, අපි මSVDD විශාල කරනවා ගොඩක් හායිපර්ස්ෆර් වලින්, ඒකෙන් අපිට ඉලක්කය එක- ප්\u200dරවේශ ද තවත්, mSVDD ගේ අන්තිම විශාලාව සම්බන්ධ විශේෂතාවක් සහ එක පාරක් පාළුවක් ඉගෙනගන්න පුළුවන්. අපි සමහර විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණය සම්පූර්ණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ නැති විශේෂ දත්ත නැති වෙනුවෙන්, ඒක mSVDD මොඩේල්ට ප්\u200dරයෝ අපි රෝටර්ස්ටර්ස් සහ නුවස්ක්\u200dරූප් දත්ත සැට් 20 ගැන පරීක්ෂණා කරනවා, ඒ වගේම පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ ප්\u200dරතිච', 'sv': 'Detta arbete presenterar multimodal djup SVDD (mSVDD) för en klass textklassificering. Genom att utöka den unimodala SVDD till en flermodal, bygger vi mSVDD med flera hypersfärer, vilket gör det möjligt för oss att bygga en mycket bättre beskrivning av måldata i en klass. Dessutom kan mSVDD:s end-to-end-arkitektur gemensamt hantera neuralt funktionslärande och en klass textinlärning. Vi inför också en mekanism för att införliva negativ övervakning i avsaknad av verkliga negativa data, vilket kan vara fördelaktigt för mSVDD-modellen. Vi genomför experiment på Reuters och 20 Newsgroup dataset, och de experimentella resultaten visar att mSVDD presterar bättre än unimodal SVDD och mSVDD kan få ytterligare förbättringar när negativ övervakning införlivas.', 'ta': 'Name Uni- modal SVDD ஐ பல வகுப்புகளுக்கு விரிவாக்கி, நாம் mSVDD பல அதிகப்பரப்புகளுடன் உருவாக்குகிறோம், அது எங்களை ஒரு வகுப்பு தரவுக்கு மிகவும் நல்ல விவரம் உர மேலும், எஎஎஸ்விடிடியின் முடிவுக்கு முடிவுக்கு கட்டுப்பாட்டு அமைப்புகள் புதிய குணங்கள் கற்றல் மற்றும் ஒரு வகுப்பு உரை  உண்மையான எதிர்மறை தகவல் இல்லாமல் நாம் எதிர்மறை கண்காணிப்பை உள்ளிடுவதற்கான ஒரு முறைமையை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். இது எம்எஸ்விடிடி மாதி நாம் ரெய்டர்ஸ் மற்றும் 20 செய்திக்குழு தரவுத்தளங்கள் மீது சோதனைகளை செய்கிறோம், சோதனையின் முடிவு', 'ur': 'یہ کام ایک کلاس متن کلاسی کے لئے بہت سی موڈال عمیق SVDD (mSVDD) کو پیش کرتا ہے۔ Uni- modal SVDD کو ایک چند موڈال کی طرف پھیلانے کے ذریعہ، ہم نے mSVDD کو چند ہیپر سفر کے ساتھ بنایا ہے، جو ہمیں ایک کلاس کے لئے بہت اچھا سفارش بنانے کے لئے ممکن ہے۔ اور اضافہ، mSVDD کی آخر-to-end architecture can jointly handle neural feature learning and one-class text learning. ہم نے بھی ایک مکانیسم پیش کرتا ہے کہ حقیقی منفی ڈیٹے کے غیر موجود منفی نظر میں منفی نظر شامل ہونے کے لئے، جو mSVDD موڈل کے لئے فائدہ پہنچا سکتی ہے۔ ہم رائٹر اور 20 نیوسگروپ ڈیٹ سٹ پر آزمائش کرتے ہیں، اور آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ mSVDD یو-modal SVDD اور mSVDD کو اضافہ کر سکتے ہیں جب منفی supervision شامل ہوتا ہے۔', 'vi': 'Công việc này tượng trưng cho SVDD sâu đa phương (mSVDD) cho hạng một. Bằng cách mở rộng SVDD cho một số phương tiện khác nhau, chúng tôi tạo mSVDD với nhiều siêu nhân, cho phép chúng tôi tạo ra mô tả tốt hơn cho dữ liệu chỉ mục tiêu loại. Thêm vào đó, cấu trúc cuối cùng của mSVDD có thể cùng quản lý việc học tập tính năng thần kinh và học chữ một lớp. Chúng tôi cũng sẽ tạo ra một cơ chế để áp dụng sự giám sát tiêu cực khi không có dữ liệu tiêu cực thật, mà có thể sẽ có lợi cho mô hình mSVDD. Chúng tôi tiến hành thí nghiệm trên các tập tin dữ liệu Reuters và 20. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy mSVDD ngoài thực hiện chứng nhận SVDD cho thời đại và mSVDD có thể cải tiến thêm khi tham gia giám sát âm tính.', 'uz': "Name Uni modal SVDD bir necha moduliga kengaytmoqchi boʻyicha, biz mSVDD bir nechta hyperlar bilan yaratimiz. Bu bizga bir sinf maʼlumot uchun juda yaxshi taʼrifi yaratishga imkoniyat beradi. @ info: whatsthis We also introduce a mechanism for incorporating negative supervision in the absence of real negative data, which can be beneficial to the mSVDD model.  Biz Reuters va 20 Newsgroup maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi tajribalarni bajaramiz va tajribalar natijalari mSVD uni modal SVDD ishga tushirishni va mSVDD yordamida negativ supervissiya qoʻshilganda koʻproq o'zgarishni oshirish mumkin.", 'bg': 'Тази работа представя мултимодална дълбока СВДД (МСВДД) за еднокласна класификация на текста. Чрез разширяване на унимодалната SVDD до мултимодална, ние изграждаме mSVDD с множество хиперсфери, които ни позволяват да изградим много по-добро описание на целеви еднокласни данни. Освен това архитектурата от край до край може съвместно да се справи с изучаването на невронни функции и еднокласно текстово обучение. Въвеждаме и механизъм за включване на отрицателен надзор при липса на реални отрицателни данни, което може да бъде от полза за модела mSVDD. Провеждаме експерименти на Ройтерс и 20 набора от данни на Нюзгруп, а експерименталните резултати показват, че mSVDD превъзхожда едномодалните SVDD и mSVDD могат да получат допълнителни подобрения при включване на отрицателен надзор.', 'nl': 'Dit werk presenteert multimodale diepe SVDD (mSVDD) voor één-klasse tekstclassificatie. Door de uni-modale SVDD uit te breiden naar een multiple modale, bouwen we mSVDD met meerdere hypersferen, die ons in staat stellen een veel betere beschrijving te bouwen voor doelgegevens van één klasse. Bovendien kan de end-to-end architectuur van mSVDD samen neuronale functies leren en één-klas tekst leren behandelen. We introduceren ook een mechanisme voor het opnemen van negatief toezicht bij afwezigheid van reële negatieve gegevens, wat gunstig kan zijn voor het mSVDD-model. We voeren experimenten uit op Reuters en 20 Newsgroup datasets, en de experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat mSVDD beter presteert dan unimodale SVDD en mSVDD verdere verbeteringen kan krijgen wanneer negatieve supervisie wordt opgenomen.', 'da': 'Dette arbejde præsenterer multimodal dyb SVDD (mSVDD) til en klasse tekst klassificering. Ved at udvide den unimodale SVDD til en multimodal en, bygger vi mSVDD med flere hypersfærer, der gør det muligt for os at opbygge en langt bedre beskrivelse af mål én klasse data. Endvidere kan end-to-end-arkitekturen af mSVDD i fællesskab håndtere neurale funktioner indlæring og one-class tekst indlæring. Vi indfører også en mekanisme til at indarbejde negativt tilsyn i mangel af reelle negative data, hvilket kan være gavnligt for mSVDD-modellen. Vi gennemfører eksperimenter på Reuters og 20 Newsgroup datasæt, og de eksperimentelle resultater viser, at mSVDD overgår unimodal SVDD og mSVDD kan få yderligere forbedringer, når negativ overvågning indarbejdes.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit stellt multimodale tiefe SVDD (mSVDD) für eine Klassifizierung von Texten vor. Durch die Erweiterung des unimodalen SVDD auf einen multiplen modalen bauen wir mSVDD mit mehreren Hypersphären auf, die es uns ermöglichen, eine viel bessere Beschreibung für Ziel-1-Klasse-Daten zu erstellen. Darüber hinaus kann die End-to-End-Architektur von mSVDD gemeinsam neuronales Feature-Lernen und ein-Class-Textlernen handhaben. Wir führen auch einen Mechanismus ein, der negative Aufsicht bei Fehlen realer negativer Daten einschließt, was für das mSVDD-Modell von Vorteil sein kann. Wir führen Experimente mit Reuters- und 20-Newsgroup-Datensätzen durch, und die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass mSVDD unimodale SVDD übertrifft und mSVDD weitere Verbesserungen erzielen kann, wenn negative Überwachung einbezogen wird.', 'hr': 'Ovaj rad predstavlja višemodalnu duboku SVDD (mSVDD) za klasifikaciju teksta jednoklase. Proširenjem unimodalnog SVDD-a na višestruku modalnu, izgradimo mSVDD s višestrukim hipersferama, koje nam omogućavaju izgraditi mnogo bolji opis za jednoklasne podatke o cilju. Osim toga, arhitektura mSVDD-a na kraju može zajedno podnijeti učenje neuroloških funkcija i učenje teksta u jednoklasi. Također predstavljamo mehanizam uključenja negativnog nadzora u odsustvu pravih negativnih podataka, koji može biti korisni za model mSVDD-a. Mi provodimo eksperimente na Reuters i 20 Newsgroup podataka, a eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da mSVDD iznosi unimodalnu SVDD i mSVDD mogu dobiti daljnje poboljšanje kada se uključuje negativna nadzor.', 'id': 'This work presents multi-modal deep SVDD (mSVDD) for one-class text classification.  Dengan memperluas SVDD uni-modal ke satu modal berbilang, kami membangun mSVDD dengan hipersfera berbilang, yang memungkinkan kami membangun deskripsi jauh lebih baik untuk data target satu kelas. Selain itu, arsitektur akhir-akhir mSVDD dapat bersama-sama menangani belajar karakteristik saraf dan belajar teks satu kelas. Kami juga memperkenalkan mekanisme untuk memasukkan pengawasan negatif tanpa data negatif nyata, yang dapat berguna untuk model mSVDD. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada Reuters dan 20 set data Newsgroup, dan hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa mSVDD lebih berharga dari SVDD uni modal dan mSVDD dapat mendapatkan peningkatan lebih lanjut ketika pengawasan negatif terlibat.', 'sw': 'This work presents multi-modal deep SVDD (mSVDD) for one-class text classification.  Kwa kuongeza SVDD ya aina hii kwa njia mbalimbali, tunajenga mSVDD kwa kiwango kikubwa cha juu, ambacho kinawezesha kutujenga maelezo bora zaidi kwa ajili ya kulenga takwimu za darasa moja. Zaidi ya hayo, ujenzi wa mwisho wa mSVDD unaweza kushughulikia ujuzi wa ujasiri na kujifunza ujumbe wa tabaka moja. Pia tunaonyesha mfumo wa kuingiza uangalizi hasi katika kutokuwepo kwa data hasi, ambao unaweza kuwa na faida kwa modeli ya mSVD. Tunafanya majaribio kwenye taarifa za Habari za Reuters na 20, na matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba mSVDD inaonyesha vizuri vya SVDD na mSVDD vinaweza kupata maendeleo zaidi pale ufuatiliaji usio na hasi unapojumuishwa.', 'fa': 'این کار برای گروه\u200cبندی متن یک کلاس SVDD (mSVDD) چند مدال را نشان می\u200cدهد. با افزایش SVDD متحد به یک متحد متحد بسازیم، ما mSVDD را با چندین hyperspheres بسازیم، که به ما اجازه می دهد که توصیف بسیار بهتر برای داده های یک کلاس هدف بسازیم. اضافه\u200cای، معماری پایان و پایان mSVDD می\u200cتواند با همدیگر یادگیری ویژه\u200cهای عصبی و یادگیری متن یک کلاس را کنترل کند. ما همچنین یک مکانیسم برای شامل نظارت منفی در غیر داده های منفی واقعی معرفی می کنیم که می تواند برای مدل mSVDD سودمند باشد. ما آزمایش\u200cهای روی رایستر و ۲۰ مجموعه داده\u200cهای نویس گروه انجام می\u200cدهیم، و نتیجه\u200cهای آزمایشی نشان می\u200cدهند که mSVDD SVDD غیر مدال و mSVDD می\u200cتوانند بهترین\u200cهای بیشتری را دریافت کنند وقتی بررسی منفی شامل شود.', 'tr': "Bu işe bir synp üçin çoklu modal derin SVDD (mSVDD) surat berer. Uni-modal SVDD'i birnäçe modal bir üçin uzaklaşdyryp, biz mSVDD'i birnäçe hiperferler bilen inşa edýäris, bu biziň bir klas maglumaty üçin has gowy bir waspy gurmana mümkin edýär. HemmSVDD'iň soňky arhitektegi neural öwrenmegi we bir klas metin öwrenmegi bilen üýtgebilir. Biz hem negatif üstüni çykarmak üçin mekanizmany çykarýarys. Bu mSVDD nusgasyna bir fayda bolar. Biz Rojters we 20 Haýsy grup veri setirlerinde synanyşy çykarýarys we synanyşyň netijesi mSVDD modal SVDD we mSVDD-iň üstünde negatif supervisiýa girişinde gowurak bolup biler.", 'af': "Hierdie werk stel multimodale diep SVDD (mSVDD) voor vir een klas teks klassifikasie. Name Deur die uni- modaal SVDD te uitbrei na 'n veelvuldige modaal een, bou ons mSVDD met veelvuldige hipersfere, wat aktiveer ons na bou 'n baie beter beskrywing vir doel een- klas data. Additionally, the end- to- end architecture of mSVDD can jointly handle neural feature learning and one- class text learning. Ons introduseer ook 'n mekanisme vir die inkorporeer van negatiewe supervisie in die absence van regte negatiewe data, wat kan voordeel wees vir die mSVDD model. Ons doen eksperimente op Reuters en 20 Nuusgroep datastelle, en die eksperimentele resultate wys dat mSVDD uitvoer unimodale SVDD en mSVDD kan verdere verbeteringe kry wanneer negatiewe supervisie inkorporeer is.", 'am': 'ይሄ ሥራ ለአንዲት-ደረጃ ጽሑፍ መግለጫ ብዙዎችን-modal ጥልቅ SVDD (mSVDD) ያሳያል። የዩን-modal SVDD ወደ ብዛት ሞዴል በመዘረጋ ጊዜ mSVDD በብዙ hyperspheres እንሠራለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም የmSVDD መጨረሻ የመጨረሻ መሠረት መሠረት በጠቅላላ ምርጫዎች እና አንድ-ክፍል ጽሑፍ ማምረሚያ ይችላል። እና ለmSVD ሞዴል የሚጠቅመው እውነተኛ ዳታ ሳይኖር የnegative ስልጣንን ለመቀበል የሚችል ስልጣን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ We conduct experiments on Reuters and 20 Newsgroup datasets, and the experimental results demonstrate that mSVDD outperforms uni-modal SVDD and mSVDD can get further improvements when negative supervision is incorporated.', 'sq': 'Ky punë paraqet SVDD të thellë multimodale (mSVDD) për klasifikimin e një klase teksti. Duke zgjeruar SVDD uni modal në një modalitet të shumtë, ne ndërtojmë mSVDD me hipersfera të shumta, që na lejojnë të ndërtojmë një përshkrim shumë më të mirë për të dhënat e objektivit të një klase. Përveç kësaj, arkitektura nga fundi në fund e mSVDD mund të trajtojë së bashku mësimin e karakteristikave nervore dhe mësimin e një klase teksti. Ne gjithashtu futim një mekanizëm për përfshirjen e mbikqyrjes negative në mungesën e të dhënave reale negative, e cila mund të jetë e dobishme për model in mSVDD. Ne kryejmë eksperimente në Reuters dhe 20 grupe të dhënash të Newsgroup dhe rezultatet eksperimentale demonstrojnë se mSVDD performon SVDD uni modal dhe mSVDD mund të marrë përmirësime të mëtejshme kur mbikqyrja negative është përfshirë.', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է մեկ դասարանի տեքստի դասակարգման համար բազմամոդային խորը սվիդի (mCVDD): By extending the uni-modal SVDD to a multiple modal one, we build mSVDD with multiple hyperspheres, that enable us to build a much better description for target one-class data.  Additionally, the end-to-end architecture of mSVDD can jointly handle neural feature learning and one-class text learning.  Մենք նաև ներկայացնում ենք մեխանիզմ բացասական վերահսկողության ներառման համար իրական բացասական տվյալների բացակայության դեպքում, որը կարող է օգտակար լինել mVDD մոդելի համար: Մենք Reuters-ի և 20 News-ի տվյալների համակարգերի վրա փորձարկումներ ենք կատարում, և փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ mSVDD-ը ունի մեկ-մոդալ SVDD-ը և mSVDD-ը կարող է ավելի լավ կատարել, երբ բացասական վերահսկողությունը ներառվում է:', 'az': "Bu işlər bir sınıf metin klasifikasyonu üçün çoxlu modal derin SVDD (mSVDD) göstərir. Uni-modal SVDD'i çoxlu modal tərzinə uzatmaq üçün, çoxlu hiperferlərlə mSVDD inşa edirik ki, bir sınıf verilənlərin məqsədilə çoxlu daha yaxşı tanımlamağımıza qadir olur. Üstəlik, mSVDD'nin son-to-end arhitektüsü nöral özellikləri öyrənməyi və bir sınıf metin öyrənməsini birlikdə idarə edə bilər. Biz də negatif gözləmə məlumatının olmadığında, mSVDD modeli üçün faydalı olaraq, negatif gözləmə məlumatını daxil etmək üçün mehanizmini təşkil edirik. Biz Reuters və 20 Newsgroup veri qurularında təcrübələr etdik, və təcrübələrin sonuçları göstərir ki, mSVDD uni modal SVDD və mSVDD-nin negativ gözətçilik içərisində daha yaxşılıqları olar.", 'bs': 'Ovaj rad predstavlja multimodalnu duboku SVDD (mSVDD) za klasifikaciju teksta jednoklase. Proširenjem unimodalnog SVDD-a na višestruku modalnu, izgradimo mSVDD sa višestrukim hipersferama, koji nam omogućava da izgradimo mnogo bolji opis za jedan klasi podataka cilja. Osim toga, arhitektura mSVDD-a na kraju može zajedno poduzeti učenje neuroloških karakteristika i učenje teksta u jednoklasi. Također predstavljamo mehanizam za uključenje negativnog nadzora u odsustvo pravih negativnih podataka, koji može biti korisni za model mSVDD-a. Mi vodimo eksperimente na Reuters i 20 Newsgroup podataka, a eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da mSVDD iznosi unimodalnu SVDD i mSVDD mogu dobiti dalje poboljšanja kada se uključuje negativna nadzor.', 'ko': '본고는 단일 텍스트 분류에 사용되는 다중모드 깊이 SVDD(mSVDD)를 제시했다.단봉SVDD를 다봉SVDD로 확장함으로써 우리는 여러 개의 초구면을 가진 mSVDD를 구축하여 목표와 같은 데이터에 대해 더 좋은 설명을 구축할 수 있다.또한 mSVDD의 끝에서 끝까지의 구조는 신경 특징 학습과 같은 텍스트 학습을 연합하여 처리할 수 있다.우리는 또한 진실한 부정적인 데이터가 부족한 상황에서 부정적인 감독을 포함하는 메커니즘을 도입했는데 이것은 mSVDD모델에 유익하다.우리는 로이터통신과 20개 뉴스팀 데이터집에서 실험을 진행했는데 실험 결과 mSVDD가 단봉SVDD보다 우수하고 부정적인 감독을 도입한 상황에서 mSVDD는 더욱 개선될 수 있음을 나타냈다.', 'bn': 'এই কাজ এক-শ্রেণীর টেক্সট বিভাগের জন্য বহুমোডাল গভীর SVDD (mSVDD) উপস্থাপন করে। ইউনিমোডাল এসভিডিকে একাধিক মোডালে বাড়িয়ে দেয়ার মাধ্যমে আমরা একাধিক হাইপারফায়ার দ্বারা mSVDD তৈরি করি, যা আমাদের একটি ক্লাসের তথ্য লক্ষ্য করা এছাড়াও, mSVDD এর শেষ পর্যন্ত আর্কিটেক্টারের শেষ পর্যন্ত নিউরেল বৈশিষ্ট্য শিক্ষা এবং এক-শ্রেণীর লেখা শিক্ষা শিখতে পারে। আমরা একই সাথে বাস্তব নেতিবাচক তথ্যের অনুপস্থিতিতে নেতিবাচক পর্যবেক্ষণের জন্য একটি মেকেন্দ্র পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই, যা এমএসভিডির মডেলে ক আমরা রেটার্স এবং ২০ নিউজ গ্রুপের ডাটাসেটে পরীক্ষা করি এবং পরীক্ষার ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করেছে যে এমএসভিডি ইউন-মোডাল এসভিডি এবং এমএসভিডি নেতিবাচক পর্যবেক্ষনের সাথে', 'cs': 'Tato práce představuje multimodální hluboký SVDD (mSVDD) pro jednotřídní klasifikaci textu. Rozšířením unimodálního SVDD na více modálních vytvoříme mSVDD s více hypersférami, které nám umožňují vytvořit mnohem lepší popis cílových dat jedné třídy. Navíc komplexní architektura mSVDD může společně zvládnout učení neuronových funkcí a učení textu v jedné třídě. Zavádíme také mechanismus pro začlenění negativního dohledu v případě absence reálně negativních dat, což může být přínosné pro model mSVDD. Provádíme experimenty na datových sadách Reuters a 20 Newsgroup a experimentální výsledky ukazují, že mSVDD překoná unimodální SVDD a mSVDD může dosáhnout dalšího zlepšení při začlenění negativního dohledu.', 'ca': "This work presents multi-modal deep SVDD (mSVDD) for one-class text classification.  Amb l'ampliació de la SVDD uni modal a una multimodal, construïm mSVDD amb múltiples hipersferas, que ens permeten construir una descripció molt millor de dades d'una classe. A més, l'arquitectura del mSVDD pot manejar conjuntament l'aprenentatge de característiques neuronals i l'aprenentatge de text d'una classe. També introduim un mecanisme per incorporar supervisió negativa en l'absència de dades negatives reals, que pot ser beneficiós per al model mSVDD. Fem experiments en Reuters i en 20 conjunts de dades de grups de notícies, i els resultats experimentals demostren que el mSVDD té resultats superiors a SVDD uni modal i mSVDD pot obtenir millores més quan s'incorpora supervisió negativa.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös on esitatud multimodaalne sügav SVDD (mSVDD) üheklassi teksti klassifitseerimiseks. Laiendades ühemodaalset SVDD-i mitmemodaalsele, ehitame mSVDD-i mitme hüpersfääriga, mis võimaldab meil luua palju parema kirjelduse sihtmärgi üheklassi andmetele. Lisaks võib mSVDD-i täielik arhitektuur ühiselt käsitleda neurofunktsioonide õppimist ja üheklassi tekstiõpet. Samuti võtame kasutusele mehhanismi negatiivse järelevalve kaasamiseks reaalsete negatiivsete andmete puudumisel, mis võib mSVDD mudelile kasulik olla. Me teeme katseid Reutersi ja 20 Newsgroupi andmekogumitega ning katsetulemused näitavad, et mSVDD ületab ühe modaalse SVDD-i ja mSVDD-i võib saada täiendavaid parandusi, kui kaasatakse negatiivne järelevalve.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään multimodaalinen syvä SVDD (mSVDD) yhden luokan tekstiluokitusta varten. Laajentamalla monimodaalisen SVDD:n monimodaaliseen, rakennamme mSVDD:n useilla hypersfääreillä, joiden avulla voimme rakentaa paljon paremman kuvauksen kohdeluokan datalle. Lisäksi mSVDD:n end-to-end-arkkitehtuuri pystyy yhdessä käsittelemään neuroominaisuuksien oppimista ja yhden luokan tekstioppimista. Otamme käyttöön myös mekanismin, jolla negatiivinen valvonta sisällytetään todellisten negatiivisten tietojen puuttuessa, mikä voi olla hyödyllistä mSVDD-mallille. Teemme kokeita Reuters- ja 20 Newsgroup-aineistolla, ja kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että mSVDD:n suorituskyky on unimodaalinen SVDD ja mSVDD voi saada lisäparannuksia negatiivisen valvonnan yhteydessä.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem kanggo nggawe supoyo -uwis kuwi ora ono berdadi sing nyimpen dadi, sing iso nggawe barang nggo model mSVDD. Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk éntuk kayong kayata datagroup sing bindi nang kayem sebutas nang kayem nggawe barang nggawe mSVDD teka-modal SVDD lan mSVDD bisa dianggawe luwih dumadhakan kanggo ngilanggar-dumadhi sing katora iso nggawe supoyo sing tatag-cara nggawe', 'sk': 'V delu je predstavljen multimodalni globoki SVDD (mSVDD) za enorazredno klasifikacijo besedila. Z razširitvijo enomodalnega SVDD na večmodalnega, gradimo mSVDD z več hipersferami, ki nam omogočajo veliko boljši opis ciljnih enorazrednih podatkov. Poleg tega lahko celovita arhitektura mSVDD skupaj upravlja učenje nevronskih funkcij in enorazredno učenje besedila. Uvedli smo tudi mehanizem za vključitev negativnega nadzora v odsotnosti resničnih negativnih podatkov, kar je lahko koristno za model mSVDD. Izvajamo eksperimente na Reuters in 20 naborih podatkov Newsgroup, rezultati eksperimentov pa kažejo, da mSVDD presega enomodalni SVDD in da lahko mSVDD dobi nadaljnje izboljšave ob vključitvi negativnega nadzora.', 'he': 'העבודה הזו מציגה SVDD עמוק רבי מודליים (mSVDD) עבור מסווג טקסט מסורה אחת. על ידי הרחיבה של SVDD אוני-מודאלי למודל מרובע, אנו בונים mSVDD עם היפרספרות מרובות, שמאפשרים לנו לבנות תיאור הרבה יותר טוב עבור מידע ממטרה אחת. בנוסף, הארכיטקטורה של mSVDD מסוגלת להתמודד ביחד עם לימוד תכונות עצביות וללמד טקסט בכיתה אחת. אנחנו גם מציגים מנגנון לשלוף פיקוח שלילי בהיעדר נתונים שליליים אמיתיים, שיכול להיות מועיל למודל mSVDD. אנו מבצעים ניסויים על רייטרס ו-20 קבוצת נתונים של קבוצת חדשות, והתוצאות הניסיוניים מראות כי mSVDD מוביל יותר SVDD וני-מודאל ומSVDD יכולים להשיג שיפורים נוספים כאשר הפיקוח שלילי מעורב.', 'ha': "Wannan aikin yana gaya wa masu motsi mai yawa masu motsi da SvDD (mSvDD) wa layin daraja guda. Ga ku shimfiɗa shirin-modal SvDD zuwa wata moda mai yawa, muna gina mSvDD da wasu hisofofa, don haka yana iya amfani da mu sami tsarin mafi kyaun kwamfyuta wa danne-danne guda. Ƙaramiwa, layin tsarin ta ƙari-zuwa-ƙari na mSvDD na iya iya amfani da amfani da tsarin tsarin neural da kuma an karanta littafin-daraja guda. Kayya, Muke nuna wani mekani da za'a shigar da surkin nega a gaba ga data masu haske, wanda yana iya amfani da shi ga misalin MSV DD. Tuna samun jarrabãwa a kan Rutums da 20 Newsgroup-danne, kuma matsalan jarrabai sun nuna cewa mSvDD na sami sunan-modal SvDD da mSvDD za ta iya ƙara kodi idan an shigar da sura negative.", 'bo': 'This work presents multi modal deep SVDD (mSVDD) for one-class text classification. By extending the uni-modal SVDD to a multiple modal one, we build mSVDD with multiple hyperspheres, that enable us to build a much better description for target one-class data. Additionally, the end-to-end architecture of mSVDD can jointly handle neural feature learning and one-class text learning. འུ་ཚོས་མི་མང་ཆུང་གསལ་ནང་འཇུག་བྱེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཅིག་སྟོན་ཐུབ། We conduct experiments on Reuters and 20 Newsgroup datasets, and the experimental results demonstrate that mSVDD outperforms uni-modal SVDD and mSVDD can get further improvements when negative supervision is incorporated.'}
{'en': 'Unsupervised Word Polysemy Quantification with Multiresolution Grids of Contextual Embeddings', 'ar': 'القياس الكمي لتعدد المعاني غير الخاضع للرقابة مع شبكات متعددة الحلول من الضمانات السياقية', 'es': 'Cuantificación de polisemia de palabras sin supervisión con cuadrículas multiresolución de incrustaciones contextuales', 'fr': "Quantification de polysémie de mots non supervisée avec grilles multirésolution d'intégrations contextuelles", 'pt': 'Quantificação de polissemia de palavras não supervisionada com grades de multiresolução de incorporações contextuais', 'ja': 'コンテキスト埋め込みのマルチレゾリューショングリッドを使用した、監督されていない単語多義性の定量化', 'zh': '无监督词多义词量化与上下文嵌多分辨率网格', 'hi': 'संदर्भ एम्बेडिंग के Multiresolution ग्रिड के साथ असुरक्षित Word Polysemy परिमाणीकरण', 'ru': 'Неконтролируемая количественная оценка полисемии слов с сетками мультиразрешения контекстных вложений', 'ga': 'Cainníochtú Polysemy Focal Gan Maoirseacht le Eangacha Iltaifeach de Leabaithe Comhthéacsúla', 'hu': 'Felügyelet nélküli szópoliszémia mennyiségi meghatározás a kontextuális beágyazások többfelbontású rácsaival', 'el': 'Ποσοτική ποσοτικοποίηση πολυσημίας λέξεων χωρίς επιτήρηση με πλέγμα πολυανάλυσης περιεχομένων ενσωμάτωσης', 'ka': 'კონტექსტულ შებეჭდვის მრავალუზომის სიტყვების პოლისმიის კონტიფიკაცია', 'lt': 'Neprižiūrima žodžių polizės kiekybė su kontekstinių įdėjimų daugiaraštiniais tinklais', 'it': 'Quantificazione della polisemia di parole non sorvegliata con griglie multirisoluzione di incorporazioni contestuali', 'ms': 'Kuantifikasi Polysemi Kata tanpa pengawasan dengan Grid Resolusi Berlipat Penjelmaan Konteksual', 'kk': 'Көп айырымдылық торлары контексті ендіру үшін қолданылмаған сөздің полизиясы', 'mk': 'Ненадгледувана квантификација на зборна полизија со мрежи со мултирезолуција на контекстни вградувања', 'mn': 'Мөн олон шийдвэрлэлтийн гадаргуудтай хэмжээний хэмжээсгүй үг олон хэмжээсүүд', 'mt': 'Kwantifikazzjoni tal-Poliżimja tal-kliem mhux sorveljata b’Grilji Multiriżoluzzjoni ta’ Embeddings Kuntest', 'ml': 'നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200d പോളിസ്റ്റിയേഷന്\u200d കൊണ്ട് Multiresolution Grids of Contextual Embeddings', 'pl': 'Kwantyfikacja nienadzorowanej polisemii sÅ‚owa z siatkami wielorozdzielczoÅ›ciowymi osadzeÅ„ kontekstowych', 'no': 'Kvantifisering med fleire oppløysing- rutenett av kontekstlege innbygging', 'ro': 'Cuantificarea polisemiei de cuvinte nesupravegheate cu grile de încorporare contextuală cu mai multe rezoluții', 'so': 'Quantification with Multiresolution Grids of Context Embeds', 'sr': 'Neobezbeđena kvantifikacija polizme reči sa višerezolucionim mrežkama kontekstualnih integracija', 'sv': 'Oserverad ordpolysemi kvantifiering med flerupplösta rutnät för kontextuella inbäddningar', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ වචන පොලිසිමිය ක්\u200dරමාණය සමග ග ගොඩක් විශේෂණ ග්\u200dරිඩ්ස් සමග', 'ta': 'கண்காணிக்கப்படாத வார்த்தை Polysemy Quantification with Multiresolution Grids of Context Embeddings', 'ur': 'غیر محافظت کلمات پولیسیمیٹ کی تعداد کے ذریعہ متوسط انبوڈینز کی Multiresolution Grids کے ساتھ', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Chưa được kiểm soát từ Polysemy Quantico với các mạng giải phóng liên quan nhúng nhúng tay', 'bg': 'Количествена полисемия на думи без надзор с множество разделителни мрежи от контекстни вграждания', 'hr': 'Neodređena kvantifikacija polizme riječi s višerezolucijskim mrežkama kontekstnih uključenja', 'id': 'Kuantifikasi Polysemi Kata Tidak Disupervisi dengan Jaringan Multiresolusi Pencampuran Konteksual', 'da': 'Ikke-overvåget ordpolysemy kvantificering med flere opløsningsnetre af kontekstuelle indlejringer', 'nl': 'Kwantificatie van woordpolysemie zonder toezicht met multiresolutie rasters van contextuele insluitingen', 'ko': '언어 환경을 바탕으로 다해상도 격자에 삽입된 무감독어 다의량화', 'sw': 'Neno isiyofuatiliwa', 'fa': 'تعداد زیادی کلمات غیرقابل حفاظت با مجموعه\u200cهای زیادی حفاظت از جمع\u200cآوری\u200cهای متوسط', 'de': 'Quantifizierung von nicht überwachten Wortpolysemien mit mehrauflösenden Rastern kontextueller Einbettungen', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Unsupervised Word Polysemy Quantification with Multiresolution Grids of Contextual Embeddings', 'hy': 'Բառերի պոլիզեմիայի անվերահսկելի քանակությամբ բազմալուծման ցանցերով', 'az': 'Əlavə edilməmiş Sözlər Çoxlu Çözünürlük Cənnətləri Əlavə Et', 'bn': 'অনযত্নির্দেশিত শব্দ পোলাইসমি কোন্টিভিশন বিষয়বস্তুর মাল্টিরেশন গ্রীডের মাধ্যমে', 'tr': 'Mazmunlar Kelimiň Çoklu Çözümleşdirim Gridleri bilen Mazmunlar', 'af': 'Onondersteunde Woord Polysemy Quantifikaasie met veelvuldige resolusie Roasters van Konteksual Inbetering', 'bs': 'Neobezbeđena kvantifikacija polizme riječi sa mnogih rezolucionalnih mreža kontekstalnih uključenja', 'ca': "Quantificació de la polisemia de paraules sense supervisió amb xarxes de múltiples resolucions d'integracions contextuals", 'cs': 'Kvantifikace nekontrolované polysémie slov s vícerozlišením Mřížky kontextových vložení', 'fi': 'Valvontaton sanapolysemian kvantifiointi kontekstuaalisten upotusten moniresoluutioisilla ruudukoilla', 'et': 'JĂ€relevalveta sĂ”na polĂŒseemia kvantitatiivne kontekstipĂ”imimiste mitmeresolutsioonivĂ”rkudega', 'sk': 'Kvantifikacija besedne polisemije brez nadzora z mrežami več ločljivosti kontekstualnih vdelav', 'ha': 'Media controller element', 'he': 'כיוון פוליזמיה מילים ללא השגחה עם רשתות רבות רזולוציה של קישורים קונטקסטיים', 'bo': 'རྒྱུན་སྒྲིག་མ་ཡོད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་སྣ་ཚོགས་མང་ཙམ་འབྲི་བརྩིས་བཟོས', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness'}
{'en': 'The number of senses of a given word, or polysemy, is a very subjective notion, which varies widely across annotators and resources. We propose a novel method to estimate polysemy based on simple geometry in the contextual embedding space. Our approach is fully unsupervised and purely data-driven. Through rigorous experiments, we show that our rankings are well correlated, with strong statistical significance, with 6 different rankings derived from famous human-constructed resources such as WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia, etc., for 6 different standard metrics. We also visualize and analyze the correlation between the human rankings and make interesting observations. A valuable by-product of our method is the ability to sample, at no extra cost, sentences containing different senses of a given word. Finally, the fully unsupervised nature of our approach makes it applicable to any language. Code and data are publicly available https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment.', 'pt': 'O número de sentidos de uma determinada palavra, ou polissemia, é uma noção muito subjetiva, que varia muito entre anotadores e recursos. Propomos um novo método para estimar a polissemia baseado em geometria simples no espaço de incorporação contextual. Nossa abordagem é totalmente não supervisionada e puramente orientada por dados. Através de experimentos rigorosos, mostramos que nossos rankings estão bem correlacionados, com forte significância estatística, com 6 rankings diferentes derivados de famosos recursos construídos por humanos, como WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia, etc., para 6 métricas padrão diferentes. Também visualizamos e analisamos a correlação entre os rankings humanos e fazemos observações interessantes. Um subproduto valioso do nosso método é a capacidade de amostrar, sem custo extra, frases contendo diferentes sentidos de uma determinada palavra. Finalmente, a natureza totalmente não supervisionada de nossa abordagem a torna aplicável a qualquer idioma. Código e dados estão disponíveis publicamente https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .', 'ar': 'عدد الحواس لكلمة معينة ، أو تعدد المعاني ، هو فكرة ذاتية للغاية ، والتي تختلف بشكل كبير عبر الحواشي والموارد. نقترح طريقة جديدة لتقدير تعدد المعاني بناءً على هندسة بسيطة في مساحة التضمين السياقية. نهجنا غير خاضع للإشراف بالكامل وقائم على البيانات فقط. من خلال تجارب صارمة ، نظهر أن تصنيفاتنا مرتبطة جيدًا ، وذات أهمية إحصائية قوية ، مع 6 تصنيفات مختلفة مستمدة من مصادر مشهورة أنشأها الإنسان مثل WordNet و OntoNotes و Oxford و Wikipedia وما إلى ذلك ، لستة مقاييس قياسية مختلفة. نحن أيضًا نتخيل ونحلل العلاقة بين التصنيفات البشرية ونقدم ملاحظات مثيرة للاهتمام. إن المنتج الثانوي القيّم لطريقتنا هو القدرة على أخذ عينات من الجمل التي تحتوي على معاني مختلفة لكلمة معينة ، دون أي تكلفة إضافية. أخيرًا ، الطبيعة غير الخاضعة للإشراف الكامل لنهجنا تجعله قابلاً للتطبيق على أي لغة. الشفرة والبيانات متاحة للجمهور https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment.', 'fr': "Le nombre de sens d'un mot donné, ou polysémie, est une notion très subjective, qui varie considérablement selon les annotateurs et les ressources. Nous proposons une nouvelle méthode d'estimation de la polysémie basée sur une géométrie simple dans l'espace d'enrobage contextuel. Notre approche est totalement non supervisée et purement axée sur les données. Grâce à des expériences rigoureuses, nous montrons que nos classements sont bien corrélés, avec une forte signification statistique, avec 6 classements différents dérivés de ressources humaines célèbres telles que WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia, etc., pour 6 métriques standard différentes. Nous visualisons et analysons également la corrélation entre les classements humains et faisons des observations intéressantes. Un sous-produit précieux de notre méthode est la capacité à échantillonner, sans frais supplémentaires, des phrases contenant différents sens d'un mot donné. Enfin, la nature totalement non supervisée de notre approche la rend applicable à toutes les langues. Le code et les données sont accessibles au public https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment.", 'es': 'El número de sentidos de una palabra determinada, o polisemia, es una noción muy subjetiva, que varía ampliamente entre anotadores y recursos. Proponemos un método novedoso para estimar la polisemia basada en una geometría simple en el espacio de incrustación contextual. Nuestro enfoque no está totalmente supervisado y se basa exclusivamente en los datos. A través de rigurosos experimentos, demostramos que nuestras clasificaciones están bien correlacionadas, con una fuerte significación estadística, con 6 clasificaciones diferentes derivadas de recursos famosos construidos por humanos, como WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia, etc., para 6 métricas estándar diferentes. También visualizamos y analizamos la correlación entre las clasificaciones humanas y hacemos observaciones interesantes. Un subproducto valioso de nuestro método es la capacidad de muestrear, sin coste adicional, oraciones que contienen diferentes sentidos de una palabra determinada. Por último, la naturaleza totalmente no supervisada de nuestro enfoque lo hace aplicable a cualquier idioma. El código y los datos están disponibles públicamente en https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment.', 'ja': '与えられた単語、つまり多義性の感覚の数は非常に主観的な概念であり、注釈者やリソースによって大きく異なります。文脈埋め込み空間における単純な幾何学に基づいて多義性を推定するための新たな方法を提案する。当社のアプローチは完全に監督されておらず、純粋にデータ駆動型です。厳密な実験を通じて、私たちのランキングは強力な統計的意義を持ち、WordNet、OntoNotes、Oxford、Wikipediaなどの有名な人間が構築したリソースから派生した6つの異なるランキングが、6つの異なる標準的な指標に対して適切に相関していることを示します。また、ヒトのランキングの相関関係を可視化して分析し、興味深い観察を行います。私たちの方法の貴重な副産物は、特定の単語のさまざまな感覚を含む文章を追加費用なしでサンプリングする能力です。最後に、当社のアプローチは完全に監督されていないため、あらゆる言語に適用できます。コードとデータは一般公開されています。https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment', 'zh': '给定单词、多义词之义,异于注器、资源之间。 一根上下文嵌空,几何度多义性新。 吾道全无监,纯粹由数驱。 以严实验,明吾名有善相关性,强计义,6异名而自名者,如WordNet、OntoNotes、Oxford、Wikipedia,施于6指标。 又可视化论人伦之相关性,而观其趣。 吾道之一直副产品能免费于包给定单词异义之句采样。 最后,我们全无监督性质使用的话。 代码数 https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment 公给。', 'hi': 'किसी दिए गए शब्द, या पॉलीसेमी की इंद्रियों की संख्या, एक बहुत ही व्यक्तिपरक धारणा है, जो एनोटेटर और संसाधनों में व्यापक रूप से भिन्न होती है। हम प्रासंगिक एम्बेडिंग स्पेस में सरल ज्यामिति के आधार पर पॉलीसेमी का अनुमान लगाने के लिए एक उपन्यास विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारा दृष्टिकोण पूरी तरह से असुरक्षित और विशुद्ध रूप से डेटा-संचालित है। कठोर प्रयोगों के माध्यम से, हम दिखाते हैं कि हमारी रैंकिंग अच्छी तरह से सहसंबद्ध है, मजबूत सांख्यिकीय महत्व के साथ, 6 अलग-अलग मानक मीट्रिक के लिए प्रसिद्ध मानव-निर्मित संसाधनों जैसे वर्डनेट, ऑनटोनोट्स, ऑक्सफोर्ड, विकिपीडिया, आदि से व्युत्पन्न 6 अलग-अलग रैंकिंग के साथ। हम मानव रैंकिंग के बीच सहसंबंध की कल्पना और विश्लेषण भी करते हैं और दिलचस्प टिप्पणियां करते हैं। हमारी विधि का एक मूल्यवान उप-उत्पाद नमूना करने की क्षमता है, बिना किसी अतिरिक्त लागत के, किसी दिए गए शब्द की विभिन्न इंद्रियों वाले वाक्य। अंत में, हमारे दृष्टिकोण की पूरी तरह से असुरक्षित प्रकृति इसे किसी भी भाषा पर लागू करती है। कोड और डेटा सार्वजनिक रूप से https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment उपलब्ध हैं।', 'ru': 'Количество органов чувств данного слова, или полисемии, является очень субъективным понятием, которое широко варьируется в зависимости от аннотаторов и ресурсов. Предложен новый метод оценки полисемии на основе простой геометрии в пространстве контекстных вложений. Наш подход полностью не контролируется и основывается исключительно на данных. С помощью тщательных экспериментов мы показываем, что наши рейтинги хорошо коррелируют, с сильной статистической значимостью, с 6 различными рейтингами, полученными из известных человеческих ресурсов, таких как WordNet, OntoNotes, Оксфорд, Википедия и т.д., для 6 различных стандартных метрик. Также мы визуализируем и анализируем корреляцию между рейтингами людей и делаем интересные наблюдения. Ценным побочным продуктом нашего метода является способность без дополнительных затрат отбирать предложения, содержащие различные чувства данного слова. Наконец, полностью неконтролируемый характер нашего подхода делает его применимым к любому языку. Код и данные находятся в открытом доступе https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .', 'ga': 'Is nóisean an-suibiachtúil é líon na gcéadfaí d’fhocal ar leith, nó iolrachas, a athraíonn go forleathan trasna anótálaithe agus acmhainní. Molaimid modh nua chun polysemy a mheas bunaithe ar chéimseata shimplí sa spás leabaithe comhthéacsúla. Tá ár gcur chuige iomlán gan mhaoirseacht agus dírithe ar shonraí amháin. Trí thurgnaimh dhian, léirímid go bhfuil ár rátálacha comhghaolaithe go maith, le tábhacht láidir staitistiúil, le 6 rátálacha éagsúla a dhíorthaítear ó acmhainní daonna-déanta cáiliúla mar WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia, etc., le haghaidh 6 mhéadracht chaighdeánach dhifriúil. Déanaimid léirshamhlú agus anailís freisin ar an gcomhghaol idir na rátálacha daonna agus déanaimid breathnuithe suimiúla. Fotháirge luachmhar dár modh is ea an cumas abairtí a bhfuil céadfaí éagsúla focal tugtha iontu a shamplaiú, gan aon chostas breise. Ar deireadh, toisc gur cur chuige atá againn go hiomlán gan maoirsiú, baineann sé le teanga ar bith. Tá cód agus sonraí ar fáil go poiblí https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .', 'hu': 'Egy adott szó érzékeinek száma, vagy poliszemia, egy nagyon szubjektív fogalom, amely széles körben változik a kommentátorok és erőforrások között. Új módszert javasolunk a poliszemia becslésére egyszerű geometria alapján a kontextuális beágyazási térben. Megközelítésünk teljes mértékben felügyelet nélkül és tisztán adatközpontú. Szigorú kísérletek révén megmutatjuk, hogy rangsoraink jól korrelálódnak, erős statisztikai jelentőséggel bírnak, 6 különböző rangsorolással, amelyek híres emberi erőforrásokból származnak, mint például WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipédia stb., 6 különböző standard mutató. Az emberi rangsorok közötti korrelációt vizualizáljuk és elemezzük, és érdekes megfigyeléseket teszünk. Módszerünk egyik értékes mellékterméke az a képesség, hogy felár nélkül mintázzunk olyan mondatokat, amelyek egy adott szó különböző érzékeit tartalmazzák. Végezetül, megközelítésünk teljes mértékben felügyelet nélküli jellege miatt bármilyen nyelvre alkalmazható. A kód és az adatok nyilvánosan hozzáférhetők https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment  .', 'el': 'Ο αριθμός των αισθήσεων μιας δεδομένης λέξης, ή πολυσημία, είναι μια πολύ υποκειμενική έννοια, η οποία ποικίλλει ευρέως μεταξύ σχολιαστών και πόρων. Προτείνουμε μια νέα μέθοδο εκτίμησης της πολυσεμίας με βάση την απλή γεωμετρία στον περιβάλλοντα χώρο ενσωμάτωσης. Η προσέγγισή μας είναι πλήρως ανεξέλεγκτη και καθαρά βασισμένη στα δεδομένα. Μέσα από αυστηρά πειράματα, αποδεικνύουμε ότι οι βαθμολογίες μας είναι καλά συσχετισμένες, με ισχυρή στατιστική σημασία, με έξι διαφορετικές βαθμολογίες που προέρχονται από διάσημους ανθρώπινους πόρους όπως η Οξφόρδη, η Βικιπαίδεια, κ.λπ., για 6 διαφορετικές τυποποιημένες μετρήσεις. Επίσης, οπτικοποιούμε και αναλύουμε τη συσχέτιση μεταξύ των ανθρώπινων κατατάξεων και κάνουμε ενδιαφέρουσες παρατηρήσεις. Ένα πολύτιμο υποπροϊόν της μεθόδου μας είναι η δυνατότητα δειγματοληψίας, χωρίς επιπλέον κόστος, προτάσεων που περιέχουν διαφορετικές αισθήσεις μιας δεδομένης λέξης. Τέλος, η πλήρως ανεξέλεγκτη φύση της προσέγγισής μας την καθιστά εφαρμόσιμη σε οποιαδήποτε γλώσσα. Ο κώδικας και τα δεδομένα είναι διαθέσιμα στο κοινό https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment  .', 'it': 'Il numero di sensi di una data parola, o polisemia, è una nozione molto soggettiva, che varia ampiamente tra annotatori e risorse. Proponiamo un nuovo metodo per stimare la polisemia basato sulla geometria semplice nello spazio contestuale di incorporazione. Il nostro approccio è completamente privo di supervisione e basato esclusivamente sui dati. Attraverso rigorosi esperimenti, mostriamo che le nostre classifiche sono ben correlate, con un forte significato statistico, con 6 diverse classifiche derivate da famose risorse umane come WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia, ecc., per 6 diverse metriche standard. Inoltre visualizziamo e analizziamo la correlazione tra le classifiche umane e facciamo osservazioni interessanti. Un prezioso sottoprodotto del nostro metodo è la capacità di campionare, senza costi aggiuntivi, frasi contenenti diversi sensi di una data parola. Infine, la natura completamente non supervisionata del nostro approccio lo rende applicabile a qualsiasi lingua. Codice e dati sono accessibili al pubblico https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment  .', 'ka': 'მითითებული სიტყვის, ან პოლისემის სიტყვის სიტყვის რაოდენობა არის ძალიან სუბექტიური წარმოდგენა, რომელიც ძალიან განსხვავებულია წარმოდგენელების და რესურსი ჩვენ მინდა პრომენტის მეტი, რომელიც პოლისემიის განსაზღვრება განსაზღვრებული ჯეომეტრიის განმავლობაში კონტექსტური დაბრუნებული სივრცე. ჩვენი პროგორმაცია უფრო უფრო განახლებელია და უფრო მხოლოდ მონაცემები. ძალიან ძალიან ექსპერიმენტებით ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ჩვენი რენგრენტები ძალიან კოლექციურია, ძალიან სტატისტიკური მნიშვნელობით, 6 განსხვავებული რენგრენტებით, როგორც WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia და განსხვავებული ჩვენ ასევე ვიზუალიზებთ და ანალიზებთ ადამიანის რენექციების კოლექცია და ინტერესური მონაცემები. ჩვენი პროდისტის მნიშვნელოვანი პროდისტის შესაძლებლობა იყო ჩვენი სიტყვის სხვადასხვა სიტყვის შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც არაფერი სიტყვის შესაძლებლობა. საბოლოოდ, ჩვენი წარმოდგენის ყველაფერად უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფ Name https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .', 'kk': 'Келтірілген сөздің немесе полицемиясының сезімдер саны - өте мақсатты түсініктер мен ресурстар бойынша айырмашылық. Қарапайым геометриясына негізделген полицемияны бағалау әдісін жасаймыз. Біздің тәсілдігіміз толық мәліметті жоқ және толық деректерді қолдануға болады. Қатты тәжірибелер арқылы, біз реттеулеріміздің күшті статистикалық маңыздылығымен, WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia және т. б. 6 стандартты метрикалық көмектесетін адам құрылған ресурстардан 6 әртүрлі реттеулерімізді көрсетедік. Сонымен қатар, адамдардың сәйкестіктерінің қатынасын көрсету және анализ және қызықты байқауларды жасаймыз. Өзіміздің әдісіміздің мәндігі - қосымша бағасы жоқ, сөздердің түрлі сезімдері келтірілген сөздің түрлі сезімдері бар. Соңында, біздің тәсіліміздің тәсіліміздің тәсілігі барлық тілдерге қолданылады. Код мен деректер жалпы https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .', 'ms': 'Bilangan perasaan perkataan tertentu, atau polisemi, adalah satu idea yang sangat subjektif, yang berbeza secara luas di antara annotator dan sumber. Kami cadangkan kaedah baru untuk menghargai polisemi berdasarkan geometri sederhana dalam ruang penyampilan kontekstual. pendekatan kita tidak diawasi sepenuhnya dan hanya dipandu data. Melalui eksperimen yang ketat, kami menunjukkan bahawa rangkaian kami adalah terkait dengan baik, dengan makna statistik yang kuat, dengan 6 rangkaian berbeza yang berasal dari sumber yang terkenal bina manusia seperti WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia, dll., untuk 6 metrik piawai berbeza. We also visualize and analyze the correlation between the human rankings and make interesting observations.  Sebuah produk sampingan berharga kaedah kita adalah kemampuan untuk sampel, tanpa biaya tambahan, kalimat yang mengandungi sens yang berbeza dari perkataan yang diberikan. Akhirnya, sifat yang tidak diawasi sepenuhnya dari pendekatan kita membuatnya berlaku pada mana-mana bahasa. Kod dan data tersedia secara awam https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .', 'ml': 'കൊടുത്ത വാക്കുകളുടെ എണ്ണം അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d പൊലിസേമിയുടെയോ വികാരങ്ങളുടെയോ വിഷയങ്ങളുടെയോ വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ഒരു ആശയം തന്ന We propose a novel method to estimate polysemy based on simple geometry in the contextual embedding space.  നമ്മുടെ അടുത്തേക്ക് പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും സൂക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു കഠിനമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളിലൂടെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു, നമ്മുടെ രാജാക്കന്മാര്\u200d നല്ല ബന്ധപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു, ശക്തിയുള്ള സ്ഥിതിക്കാരികളുമാണ്, പ്രശസ്തമായ മനുഷ്യര മനുഷ്യരുടെ കൂട്ടത്തിലുള്ള ബന്ധത്തെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണുകയും അന്വേഷിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. ആശ്ചര്യമായ കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d ചെ നമ്മുടെ രീതിയിലെ വിലപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഒരു വിലപ്പെട്ട വാക്കിന്റെ വ്യത്യസ്ത വാക്കുകളില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ചെലവഴിക്കാതെ മാത അവസാനം, നമ്മുടെ സമ്പ്രദായത്തിന്റെ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും സൂക്ഷിക്കാത്ത സ്വഭാവം അത് ഏതു ഭാഷയ്ക്കും പ്രയോജനപ്പ കോഡും വിവരങ്ങളും പ്രസിദ്ധമായി ലഭ്യമല്ല https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .', 'mt': 'In-numru ta’ sensi ta’ kelma partikolari, jew poliżimja, huwa kunċett soġġettiv ħafna, li jvarja ħafna bejn l-annotaturi u r-riżorsi. Aħna nipproponu metodu ġdid għall-istima tal-polisimja bbażata fuq ġeometrija sempliċi fl-ispazju ta’ inkorporazzjoni kuntestwali. L-approċċ tagħna mhuwiex sorveljat għal kollox u huwa bbażat purament fuq id-dejta. Permezz ta’ esperimenti rigorużi, nuru li l-klassifikazzjonijiet tagħna huma korrelati sew, b’sinifikat statistiku qawwi, b’6 klassifikazzjonijiet differenti derivati minn riżorsi magħrufa mibnija mill-bniedem bħal WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia, eċċ., għal 6 metriċi standard differenti. Aħna niviżwalizzaw u nianalizzaw ukoll il-korrelazzjoni bejn il-klassifikazzjonijiet umani u nagħmlu osservazzjonijiet interessanti. Prodott sekondarju prezzjuż tal-metodu tagħna huwa l-kapaċità li jittieħdu kampjuni, mingħajr spejjeż żejda, sentenzi li fihom sensi differenti ta’ kelma partikolari. Fl-aħħar nett, in-natura kompletament mhux sorveljata tal-approċċ tagħna tagħmilha applikabbli għal kwalunkwe lingwa. Il-kodiċi u d-dejta huma disponibbli għall-pubbliku https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .', 'mn': 'Дараагдсан үг эсвэл полизмийн мэдрэмжүүдийн тоо нь маш сэтгэл хөдлөл юм. Энэ нь сэтгэл хөдлөл, нөөц хөрөнгө оруулж буй хүмүүсийн тухай ихэвчлэн өөрчлөгдөж байна. Бид энгийн геометрийг тооцоолох шинэ арга зам сануулдаг. Бидний арга баримт бүрэн дэмжигдэхгүй, цэвэрхэн өгөгдлийн хөдөлгөөн. Хатуу туршилтаар бид үндсэн хэлбэрээр, хүчтэй статистикийн ач холбогдолтой, WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia гэх мэт алдартай хүний бүтээгдэхүүнээс 6 өөр хэлбэрээр гарч ирсэн байдаг. Мөн бид хүн төрөлхтний холбоотой холбоотой болон сонирхолтой байдлыг харуулж, шинжилгээ хийдэг. Бидний аргын үнэ цэнэтэй бүтээгдэхүүн бол нэмэлт үнэ цэнэтэй, өгүүлбэрээс өөр өөр мэдрэмжүүдийг агуулдаг үг юм. Эцэст нь бидний ойлголтын бүрэн тодорхойгүй байдал нь хэл дээр хэрэглэгддэг. Код болон өгөгдлийн санаа олон нийтэд https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .', 'lt': 'Tam tikro žodžio jausmų skaičius arba polisemija yra labai subjektyvi sąvoka, kuri labai skiriasi tarp anotatorių ir išteklių. Siūlome naują metodą, pagal kurį būtų galima apskaičiuoti polisemiją, pagrįstą paprasta geometrija kontekstinėje įterpimo erdvėje. Mūsų požiūris visiškai nepastebimas ir pagrįstas vien tik duomenimis. Atliekant griežtus eksperimentus parodome, kad mūsų reitingai gerai koreliuojami, turintys didelę statistinę reikšmę, su 6 skirtingais reitingais, gautais iš žinomų žmogiškai sukurtų išteklių, pvz., WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia ir t. t., pagal 6 skirtingus standartinius rodiklius. Mes taip pat vizualizuojame ir analizuojame žmonių rangų koreliaciją ir darome įdomų stebėjimą. Vertingas mūsų metodo šalutinis produktas yra gebėjimas, be papildomų sąnaudų, imti sakinius, kuriuose yra skirtingų tam tikro žodžio pojūčių. Galiausiai dėl visiškai nepastebimo mūsų požiūrio pobūdžio jis taikomas bet kuriai kalbai. Code and data are publicly available  https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .', 'pl': 'Liczba zmysłów danego słowa, czyli polisemii, jest bardzo subiektywnym pojęciem, które różni się znacznie w zależności od adnotatorów i zasobów. Proponujemy nową metodę oszacowania polisemii w oparciu o prostą geometrię w kontekstowej przestrzeni osadzania. Nasze podejście jest w pełni bez nadzoru i wyłącznie oparte na danych. Poprzez rygorystyczne eksperymenty pokazujemy, że nasze rankingi są dobrze skorelowane, o silnym znaczeniu statystycznym, z sześcioma różnymi rankingami pochodzącymi ze słynnych zasobów konstruowanych przez ludzi, takich jak WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia itp., dla 6-ciu różnych standardowych wskaźników. Wizualizujemy i analizujemy również korelację pomiędzy rankingami ludzkimi oraz dokonujemy ciekawych obserwacji. Cennym produktem ubocznym naszej metody jest możliwość bez dodatkowych kosztów próbowania zdań zawierających różne zmysły danego słowa. Wreszcie, w pełni bez nadzoru charakter naszego podejścia sprawia, że stosuje się go do każdego języka. Kod i dane są publicznie dostępne https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment  .', 'ro': 'Numărul de simțuri ale unui anumit cuvânt, sau polisemie, este o noțiune foarte subiectivă, care variază foarte mult în funcție de adnotatori și resurse. Propunem o metodă nouă de estimare a polisemiei bazată pe geometrie simplă în spațiul contextual de încorporare. Abordarea noastră este complet nesupravegheată și bazată exclusiv pe date. Prin experimente riguroase, arătăm că clasamentele noastre sunt bine corelate, cu o semnificație statistică puternică, cu 6 clasamente diferite derivate din resurse umane renumite, cum ar fi WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia, etc., pentru 6 valori standard diferite. De asemenea, vizualizăm și analizăm corelația dintre clasamentele umane și facem observații interesante. Un produs secundar valoros al metodei noastre este capacitatea de a proba, fără costuri suplimentare, propoziții care conțin diferite simțuri ale unui anumit cuvânt. În cele din urmă, natura complet nesupravegheată a abordării noastre o face aplicabilă oricărei limbi. Codul și datele sunt disponibile publicului https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment  .', 'mk': 'Бројот на чувства на даден збор, или полисимија, е многу субјективна идеја, која многу се разликува меѓу анотаторите и ресурсите. Предложуваме нов метод за проценка на полисемијата базирана на едноставна геометрија во контекстуалниот вставен простор. Нашиот пристап е целосно ненадгледуван и чисто врзан со податоци. Со строги експерименти покажуваме дека нашите рангирања се добро поврзани, со силно статистичко значење, со 6 различни рангирања изведени од познати човечки конструирани ресурси како што се WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia итн., за 6 различни стандардни метрики. Исто така ја визуелизираме и анализираме корелацијата помеѓу човечките рангирања и правиме интересни набљудувања. Вреден супроизвод од нашиот метод е способноста да примериме, без дополнителна цена, реченици кои содржат различни чувства на одреден збор. Конечно, целосната ненадгледувана природа на нашиот пристап го прави тоа важно за било кој јазик. Code and data are publicly available  https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment  .', 'no': 'Talet på følelser til eit gitt ord eller polysemi er ein veldig subjektiv notis, som varierer heilt over annotatorar og ressursar. Vi foreslår eit roman metode for å estimere polysemet basert på enkle geometri i kontekstalt innbyggingsplass. Tilnærminga vårt er fullstendig ikkje oppretta og pur datadrivt. Gjennom sterke eksperimenter viser vi at rankingane våre er godt korrelaterte, med sterke statistiske betydning, med 6 ulike rankingar utvikla frå kjente menneske konstruerte ressursar som WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia osv. for 6 ulike standardmeterikar. Vi kan også visualisere og analysere korrelasjonen mellom menneske rekningane og gjere interessante observasjonar. Eit verdileg etterproduksjon av metoden vårt er det muligheten til å prøve prøve, med ingen ekstra kostnad, setningar som inneheld ulike senter av eit gitt ord. Etter slutt, den fullstendig ukjende naturen av tilnærminga vårt gjer det tilgjengeleg for kvar språk. Kode og data er tilgjengeleg offentlig https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .', 'sr': 'Broj čula određene reči ili polizemije je vrlo subjektivna ideja, koja se široko razlikuje preko annotatora i resursa. Predlažemo novu metodu da procenimo polizemiju baziranu na jednostavnoj geometriji u kontekstualnom ugrađenom prostoru. Naš pristup je potpuno neodređen i čist podatak. Kroz teške eksperimente, pokazujemo da su naši redovi dobro povezani, sa jakim statističkim značajem, sa 6 različitih redova iz poznatih ljudskih resursa poput WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia, itd., za 6 različitih standardnih metrika. Takođe vizualiziramo i analiziramo povezanost između ljudskih redova i činimo zanimljive promatranja. Vrjedna po proizvodu našeg metoda je sposobnost da uzmemo uzorak, bez dodatne cene, rečenice koje sadrže različite čula određene reči. Konačno, potpuno neodređena priroda našeg pristupa je primjenjiva na bilo koji jezik. Kod i podaci su javno dostupni https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment -Da.', 'si': 'දෙන්න පුළුවන් වචනයක්, නැත්තම් පොලිසිමියක්, ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, ඒක තරම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනස් වෙන්න අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සාමාන්\u200dය භාවිමිතියේ සාමාන්\u200dය භාවිමිතිය අනුමාණය කරන්න පොලිසිමියාව අනුමාණය කරනවා. අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ නැහැ ඒ වගේම සුදුසුදු දත්ත ප හරිම පරීක්ෂණාවන් වලින්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ රැජින්ස් හොඳටම සම්බන්ධ වෙලා තියෙන්නේ, ශක්තිමත් සංඛ්යාත්මක විශේෂයෙන්, 6 වෙනස් රැජින්ස් වලි අපි මිනිස්සු ප්\u200dරමාණයක් අතර සම්බන්ධ විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා සහ විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා. අපේ පද්ධතියේ විශේෂ ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන්, විශේෂ විශේෂ වචනයක් තියෙන වචනයක් නෑ. අන්තිමේදී, අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනයේ සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම නිර්මාණය කරපු ස්වභාවිතාවක් ඒක හැම භාෂාවට ප Name https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .', 'sv': 'Antalet sinnen i ett givet ord, eller polysemi, är ett mycket subjektivt begrepp, som varierar mycket mellan kommentatorer och resurser. Vi föreslår en ny metod för att uppskatta polysemi baserat på enkel geometri i det kontextuella inbäddningsutrymmet. Vårt tillvägagångssätt är helt obevakat och helt datadrivet. Genom rigorösa experiment visar vi att våra rankningar är väl korrelerade, med stark statistisk betydelse, med 6 olika rankningar härledda från kända mänskliga resurser som WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia, etc., för 6 olika standardmått. Vi visualiserar och analyserar också korrelationen mellan de mänskliga rankningarna och gör intressanta observationer. En värdefull biprodukt av vår metod är förmågan att utan extra kostnad prova meningar som innehåller olika sinnen av ett givet ord. Slutligen gör vårt tillvägagångssätt helt obevakat att det är tillämpligt på alla språk. Kod och data är allmänt tillgängliga https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment  .', 'ta': 'கொடுக்கப்பட்ட வார்த்தையின் எண்ணிக்கையின் அல்லது போலிசேமியின் எண்ணிக்கை நாம் ஒரு புள்ளியல் முறைமையை பரிந்து கொள்கிறோம் தற்போது உள்ளிடும் இடைவெளி எங்கள் அணுக்கம் முழுவதும் பாதுகாக்கப்பட்டது மற்றும் சுத்தமான தரவு இயக்கப்பட்டது. கடுமையான சோதனைகளின் மூலம் நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் எங்கள் ராங்கிங்கள் நன்றாக இணைந்து இருக்கின்றன, வலிமையான புள்ளிவிவரக்குறிப்புகளுடன், 6 வேறு வித்தியாசமான மனித உருவாக்கப்பட்ட நாம் மனித ஒட்டகங்களுக்கிடையே இணைப்பை பார்க்க மற்றும் ஆய்வு மற்றும் சுவாரஸ்யமான பார்வைகளை செய்ய. எங்கள் முறைமையில் ஒரு மதிப்புள்ள வார்த்தைகள் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட வார்த்தையின் வித்தியாசமான உணர்வுகளை கொண்டு மாதிரிக் இறுதியில், எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டின் முழுமையாக பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத இயல்பு அது எந்த மொழியிலும் பயன்படுத குறியீடு மற்றும் தகவல் பொதுவாக கிடைக்கும் https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .', 'so': 'Isticmaalka ereyga la siiyay ama polysemi waa fikr aad u muhiim ah, taasoo aad u kala duduwan kuwa dhibaataysan iyo rasiliyadooda. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab saxda ah oo ku qiimeynaya polysemi oo ku saleysan geometry fudud oo ku qoran meesha ugu soo socda. Dhaqdhaqaalkayagu waa mid aan la ilaalin oo kali ah lagu wado macluumaad. Imtixaanka si adag ah ayaannu ku muujinnaa in boqorradayadii ay ku xiran yihiin, waxayna leeyihiin qiimaha xoogga badan, waxaana ka soo baxay 6 meelood oo kala duduwan oo ay ka yimaadeen hantida dadka maamuus ah, sida WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia, iyo 6 noocyo oo kala duwan. Sidoo kale waxaynu fiirinaynaa oo baaraynaa xiriirka u dhexeeya dadka, waxaana sameynaa aragtida xiiso leh. Qiimaha dhaqaalaha qaababkayaga waa awoodda sameynta aan kharash dheeraad ah ku jirin imtixaan kala duduwan hadal la siiyey. Ugu dambaysta, dabiicadda aan la ilaalin karin ee dhaqdhaqaalahayaga ayaa ku habboon luqad kasta. Codeynta iyo macluumaadka waxaad ku heleysaa bayaan https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .', 'ur': 'ایک لفظ یا مشرکیت کی تعداد ایک بہت موجود نظر ہے، جسے اذیت کرنے والوں اور منابعوں کے درمیان مختلف ہے. ہم ایک نئی طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ پالیسمی کا اندازہ پولیٹیٹریسی پر آسانی جسمٹریسی پر بنیاد رکھے۔ ہماری طریقہ پوری طریقہ نہیں ہے سخت آزمائش کے ذریعہ، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ہماری رینگ بہت اچھی مرتبہ ہے، مضبوط آمار تعریف کے ساتھ، 6 مختلف رینگ کے ساتھ مشهور انسان بنائے ہوئے منابع سے، جیسے WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia اور اگلے، 6 مختلف استاندارڈ میٹریک کے لئے. ہم نے انسان کے درجے کے درمیان تعلق کو بھی دیکھا اور تحقیق کیا اور دلچسپ نظر بناتے ہیں۔ ہمارے طریقے کا ایک مقدار بغیر اضافہ کے مطابق نمونے کا قابل ہے، کوئی اضافہ قیمت کے بغیر کسی بات کی مختلف سنسوں میں لگا رہا ہے. بالآخر، ہمارے تقریبا کی پوری غیر قابل تحقیق کی تعریف اسے ہر زبان پر لازم بناتا ہے. کڈ اور ڈیٹا ظاہر طور پر موجود ہیں https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .', 'uz': "Koʻrsatilgan so'zning soni yoki polysemi soni, juda muhim fikr. Bu taʼminlovchilar va rasmlar bilan ko'plab turadi. Biz davom etilgan davomida oddiy geometri asosida polysemi qidirish uchun novel usulini tahlil qilamiz. Bizning usuli butunlay saqlanmagan va faqat ma'lumot bilan ishlab chiqaradi. Biz murakkab tajribalar orqali biz bizning chegaralarimiz juda yaxshi bog'liq, statistika muhimligi bilan, va 6 turli standard metriklarga, faqat inson quyidagi 6 turli rasmlardan boshqa shakllar bor. Biz odamlar orasidagi munosabatlarni ko'rinamiz va qiziqarli tajriba qilamiz. Bu usulning qiymatlarimizning qiymati esa misol bilan ko'proq qiymatda gapiradigan so'zlar bir so'zlar bilan bir xil hisobga ega. Endi, bizning murakkablarimizning butun muvaffaqiyatli sodda bu tilga qo'llab beradi. Kodlash va maʼlumotlar toʻgʻri mavjud https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .", 'vi': 'Số giác quan của một từ cụ thể, hoặc là dạng đa thể, là một khái niệm rất chủ quan, rất khác nhau giữa các nhà biên niên và nguồn tài nguyên. Chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp mới để ước lượng đa dạng dựa trên hình học đơn giản trong không gian tổ chức ngữ cảnh. Cách tiếp cận của chúng ta hoàn toàn không giám sát và chỉ dựa trên dữ liệu. Qua các thí nghiệm khắc nghiệt, chúng tôi cho thấy các loại chúng tôi được liên quan cẩn thận, với giá trị thống kê mạnh mẽ, với sáu loại khác nhau được phân loại từ các nguồn nhân tạo nổi tiếng như WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia, v. cho 6 thước đo tiêu chuẩn khác nhau. Chúng tôi cũng hình dung và phân tích mối tương quan giữa các loại người và quan sát thú vị. Một sản phẩm quý giá của phương pháp này là khả năng thử nghiệm, không tốn thêm chi phí, các câu có các giác quan khác nhau của một từ đã nói. Cuối cùng, tính chất không giám sát hoàn to àn của phương pháp khiến nó áp dụng cho bất kỳ ngôn ngữ nào. Mật mã và dữ liệu có thể công khai https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment Không.', 'nl': 'Het aantal zintuigen van een bepaald woord, of polysemie, is een zeer subjectief begrip, dat sterk varieert tussen annotatoren en bronnen. We stellen een nieuwe methode voor om polysemie te schatten op basis van eenvoudige geometrie in de contextuele inbeddingsruimte. Onze aanpak is volledig onbeheerd en puur datagedreven. Door middel van rigoureuze experimenten laten we zien dat onze rankings goed gecorreleerd zijn, met een sterke statistische significantie, met zes verschillende rankings afgeleid van beroemde door mensen geconstrueerde bronnen zoals WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia, enz., voor zes verschillende standaard metrics. We visualiseren en analyseren ook de correlatie tussen de human rankings en maken interessante observaties. Een waardevol bijproduct van onze methode is de mogelijkheid om zonder extra kosten zinnen te testen die verschillende zintuigen van een bepaald woord bevatten. Ten slotte is onze aanpak zonder toezicht van toepassing op elke taal. Code en gegevens zijn openbaar beschikbaar https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment  .', 'da': 'Antallet af sanser i et givet ord, eller polysemi, er en meget subjektiv begreb, som varierer meget på tværs af kommentatorer og ressourcer. Vi foreslår en ny metode til at estimere polysemi baseret på enkel geometri i det kontekstuelle indlejringsrum. Vores tilgang er fuldt ud uautoriseret og udelukkende datadrevet. Gennem strenge eksperimenter viser vi, at vores placeringer er godt korreleret, med stærk statistisk betydning, med 6 forskellige placeringer afledt af berømte menneskelige konstruerede ressourcer som WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia osv., for 6 forskellige standard metrics. Vi visualiserer og analyserer også sammenhængen mellem de menneskelige rangeringer og laver interessante observationer. Et værdifuldt biprodukt af vores metode er evnen til uden ekstra omkostninger at prøve sætninger, der indeholder forskellige sanser af et givet ord. Endelig gør vores tilgangs fuldstændig uautoriserede karakter, at den gælder for ethvert sprog. Kode og data er offentligt tilgængelige https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment  .', 'bg': 'Броят на сетивата на дадена дума или полисемия е много субективно понятие, което варира широко в различните анотатори и ресурси. Предлагаме нов метод за оценка на полисемията въз основа на проста геометрия в контекстното вградено пространство. Нашият подход е напълно без надзор и изцяло базиран на данни. Чрез строги експерименти, ние показваме, че нашите класации са добре корелирани, със силна статистическа значимост, с 6 различни класации, получени от известни човешки ресурси като за 6 различни стандартни показатели. Също така визуализираме и анализираме корелацията между човешките класации и правим интересни наблюдения. Ценен страничен продукт на нашия метод е способността да пробваме, без допълнителни разходи, изречения, съдържащи различни сетива на дадена дума. И накрая, напълно ненадзорният характер на нашия подход го прави приложим за всеки език. Кодът и данните са публично достъпни https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment  .', 'de': 'Die Anzahl der Sinne eines bestimmten Wortes, oder Polysemie, ist eine sehr subjektive Vorstellung, die je nach Annotator und Ressourcen sehr unterschiedlich ist. Wir schlagen eine neuartige Methode vor, um Polysemie basierend auf einfacher Geometrie im kontextuellen Einbettungsraum zu schätzen. Unser Ansatz ist völlig unbeaufsichtigt und rein datengetrieben. Durch rigorose Experimente zeigen wir, dass unsere Rankings gut korreliert sind, mit starker statistischer Signifikanz, mit sechs verschiedenen Rankings abgeleitet von berühmten human-konstruierten Ressourcen wie WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia, etc., für sechs verschiedene Standardmetriken. Wir visualisieren und analysieren auch die Korrelation zwischen den Human Rankings und machen interessante Beobachtungen. Ein wertvolles Nebenprodukt unserer Methode ist die Möglichkeit, ohne zusätzliche Kosten Sätze zu testen, die verschiedene Sinne eines bestimmten Wortes enthalten. Schließlich ist unser Ansatz aufgrund der völlig unbeaufsichtigten Natur auf jede Sprache anwendbar. Code und Daten sind öffentlich zugänglich https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment  .', 'id': 'Bilangan sensor dari kata tertentu, atau polisemi, adalah ide yang sangat subjektif, yang berbeda dengan luas di antara annotator dan sumber daya. Kami mengusulkan metode baru untuk memperkirakan polisemi berdasarkan geometri sederhana di ruang penyampilan kontekstual. pendekatan kita sepenuhnya tidak diawasi dan hanya data-driven. Melalui eksperimen yang ketat, kami menunjukkan bahwa rangkaian kami terkait dengan baik, dengan signifikan statistik yang kuat, dengan 6 rangkaian berbeda yang berasal dari sumber daya terkenal yang dibuat manusia seperti WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia, dll., untuk 6 metrik standar berbeda. Kami juga membayangkan dan menganalisis korelasi antara peringkat manusia dan membuat pengamatan menarik. Sebuah produk samping yang berharga dari metode kita adalah kemampuan untuk mencampur, tanpa biaya tambahan, kalimat yang mengandung sens berbeda dari kata tertentu. Akhirnya, sifat yang tidak diawasi sepenuhnya dari pendekatan kita membuatnya berlaku pada bahasa apapun. Kode dan data tersedia publik https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment Apa?', 'sw': 'Idadi ya hisia za neno lililotolewa, au la utamaduni, ni dhana yenye msingi sana, ambazo zinatofautiana sana kwa matatizo na rasilimali. Tunazipendekeza njia ya riwaya ya kutathmini polysemi kwa kutumia geometri rahisi katika anga la sasa. Hatua yetu haijawekwa kabisa na haina taarifa pekee. Kwa kupitia majaribio makubwa, tunaonyesha kwamba mabango yetu yanahusiana vizuri, wenye umuhimu wa takwimu, na rangi 6 tofauti zilizotokana na rasilimali maarufu za binadamu kama vile WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia, etc, kwa njia 6 tofauti za viwango vya kawaida. We also visualize and analyze the correlation between the human rankings and make interesting observations.  Kithamani cha uzalishaji wa njia yetu ni uwezo wa sampuli, bila gharama za ziada, hukumu zinazohusu hisia tofauti za neno lililopewa. Mwisho, asili isiyohifadhiwa kabisa ya mbinu yetu inafanya iwe inafaa kwa lugha yoyote. Sheria na taarifa zinapatikana hadharani https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .', 'ko': '한 단어나 다의어의 의미수는 매우 주관적인 개념으로 주석자와 자원에서 차이가 매우 크다.우리는 상하문이 공간에 박혀 있는 간단한 기하학적 다의어 추정 방법을 제시했다.우리의 방법은 완전히 감독을 받지 않고 데이터에 의해 구동된다.엄격한 실험을 통해 우리는 우리의 순위가 매우 좋은 관련성을 가지고 매우 강한 통계적 의미를 가진다는 것을 발견했다. 우리는 유명한 인적자원에서 6개의 다른 순위를 얻었다. 예를 들어WordNet, OnNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia 등은 6개의 서로 다른 표준 도량에 사용된다.우리는 인류 랭킹 간의 상관성을 가시화하고 분석하며 흥미로운 관찰도 한다.우리의 방법의 가치 있는 부산물 중 하나는 별도의 비용이 들지 않는 상황에서 주어진 단어의 다른 의미를 포함하는 문장을 샘플링할 수 있다는 것이다.마지막으로, 우리의 방법은 전혀 감독을 받지 않기 때문에 어떠한 언어에도 적용된다.코드와 데이터는 공개된 것이다https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .', 'tr': 'Berilen sözüň sany, ýa-da polysemiýanyň sany örän subjektdir bir düşünjelidir. Bu nusgasyzçylar we çeşmeleriň arasynda üýtgeşidir. Biz polisemiýany örän basit geometriýa daşarylan ýagdaýy tahmin etmek üçin bir täze metody teklip edýäris. Biziň ýaryşymyz doly tassyklanmadyk we düzgün data sürüjili. Köp deneylerimiz bilen, sahyplarymyzyň gowy görnüşinde, güýçli statistik möhümatlary bilen, WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia we bölegi üçin 6 dürli standart metriklerden döredilen 6 dürli derejes bar. Biz hem adamlaryň düzgünleriniň arasynda görselleşini we çözümleşini we gyzykly gözlemler edip görýäris. Biziň täzimimiziň önümizdeki deň bahaly bir sözlerimiz beýleki duýgularyny barlap örneklemek ukypdyr. Soňunda, biziň golaýymyzyň tamamlanmadyk tebigaty her dile uygulandyrýar. _Mazmunlar https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .', 'af': "Die aantal senses van 'n gegewe woord, of polisemie is 'n baie subjektiewe notie, wat verskil groot oor annotators en hulpbronne. Ons voorstel 'n roman metode om polisemie te vurdering gebaseer op eenvoudige geometrie in die contextual inbêderspasie. Ons toegang is volledig nie onderwerp en net data gedryf. Deur rige eksperimente wys ons dat ons rankings goed verbreek is, met sterk statistiese betekening, met 6 verskillende rankings afgelei van familiese mens-konstrukteerde hulpbronne soos WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia, ensfh., vir 6 verskillende standaard metrike. Ons visualiseer en analiseer die korrelasie tussen die menslike rangings en maak interessante observasies. 'n waardelike deur-produkt van ons metode is die moontlik om voorbeeld te maak, op geen ekstra koste, setnings wat verskillende senses van 'n gegewe woord bevat. Eindelik maak die volledige onderwerp van ons toegang dit toewenbaar aan enige taal. Kode en data is openlik beskikbaar https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .", 'hr': 'Broj čula određene riječi ili polizemije je vrlo subjektivna ideja, koja se široko razlikuje preko annotatora i resursa. Predlažemo novu metodu za procjenu polizemije na osnovu jednostavne geometrije u kontekstualnom ugrađenom prostoru. Naš pristup je potpuno neodređen i čisti podaci. Kroz teške eksperimente, pokazujemo da su naši redovi dobro povezani, s jakim statističkim značajem, sa 6 različitih redova iz poznatih ljudskih resursa poput WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia itd., za 6 različitih standardnih metrika. Također vizualiziramo i analiziramo povezanost između ljudskih redova i činimo zanimljive promatranja. Vrjedna po proizvodu našeg metoda je sposobnost uzoraka bez dodatnih cijena, rečenica koja sadrži različite osjećaje određene riječi. Konačno, potpuno neodređena priroda našeg pristupa primjenjuje na bilo koji jezik. Kod i podaci su javno dostupni https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment -Da.', 'am': 'የተሰጠው ቃላት ወይም የፖሊስቲም ቁጥር እጅግ ታዋቂ አሳብ ነው፤ በተለየ ተቃዋሚዎች እና ሀብትዎች ይለያያሉ፡፡ We propose a novel method to estimate polysemy based on simple geometry in the contextual embedding space.  ልግስናችን በሙሉ ያልጠበቀ እና የተለየ ዳታ ነው፡፡ በብርቱ ፈተናዎች፣ የንግሥታቶቻችንን አካባቢ እናስታይናለን፣ ለ6 የተለየ ስርዓት ሚትርኮች፣ WordNet፣ OntoNotes፣ Oxford፣ Wikipedia 等 6 የተለየ የሰው ሀብት የሚደረጉት 6 የተለየ ደረጃዎች ናቸው፡፡ እናሳየዋለን እናስተዋልማለን እና በሰው መካከል ግንኙነት እናሳውቀዋለን እናስደጋግማለን፡፡ በሥርዓታችን ሀብት የተከበረውን ቃላት የተሰጠውን የልዩ እውቀት የሚይዘውን መክፈት ነው፡፡ በመጨረሻው፣ የደረጃችን ፍጹም ያልጠበቀው ሥርዓት ለቋንቋ ሁሉ ይደረግበታል፡፡ የኮድ እና ዳታ በመግለጥ ተገኝቷል https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .', 'sq': 'Numri i ndjenjave të një fjale të caktuar, ose polizimi, është një koncept shumë subjektiv, i cili ndryshon gjerësisht nëpërmjet anotatorëve dhe burimeve. We propose a novel method to estimate polysemy based on simple geometry in the contextual embedding space.  Përqafimi ynë është plotësisht i pashqyrur dhe i përdorur vetëm nga të dhënat. Nëpërmjet eksperimenteve rigoroze, ne tregojmë se renditjet tona janë të korrelacionuara mirë, me rëndësi të fortë statistikore, me 6 renditje të ndryshme të nxjerra nga burimet e famshme të ndërtuara nga njerëzit, të tilla si WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia, etj., për 6 metrika standarte të ndryshme. We also visualize and analyze the correlation between the human rankings and make interesting observations.  Një produkt i vlefshëm i metodës sonë është aftësia për të provuar, pa kosto shtesë, fjalë që përmban ndjenja të ndryshme të një fjale të caktuar. Më në fund, natyra plotësisht e pazgjidhur e qasjes sonë e bën të aplikueshme për çdo gjuhë. Kodi dhe të dhënat janë në dispozicion publik https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment - Po.', 'hy': 'Որոշ բառի կամ պոլիզեմիայի զգացմունքների քանակը շատ սուբյեկտիվ հասկացություն է, որը շատ տարբերվում է annoտորների և ռեսուրսների միջև: Մենք առաջարկում ենք մի նոր մեթոդ պոլիզեմիայի գնահատելու համար, որը հիմնված է պարզ երկրաչափության վրա կոնտեքստալ ներդրման տարածքում: Our approach is fully unsupervised and purely data-driven.  Խիստ փորձարկումների միջոցով մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր դասակարգումները լավ կապված են, ուժեղ վիճակագրական կարևորությամբ, 6 տարբեր դասակարգումների հետ, որոնք կազմված են հայտնի մարդկային կառուցվածքով ռեսուրսներից, ինչպիսիք են WordNet, Օնտոնոտեսը, Օքսֆորդը, Վիք Մենք նաև տեսնում և վերլուծում ենք մարդկային դասակարգման միջև կապը և հետաքրքիր դիտարկումներ ենք կատարում: Մեր մեթոդի արժեքավոր կողմնակի արդյունքն այն է, որ առանց ավելին արժեքի կարող ենք ընտրել նախադասություններ, որոնք պարունակում են որոշ բառերի տարբեր զգացմունքներ: Վերջապես, մեր մոտեցումների լիովին անվերահսկված բնույթը դարձնում է այն կիրառելի ցանկացած լեզվի համար: Կոդը և տվյալները հասանելի են https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .', 'fa': 'تعداد احساسات یک کلمه یا polysemy، یک نظر بسیار subjektiv است که در طول مشاهده کنندگان و منابع تغییر می\u200cدهد. ما یک روش نوی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا پلیسمی را بر اساس geometry ساده در فضای متوسط پیدا کنیم. دسترسی ما کاملاً ناپذیر و کاملاً به اطلاعات راهنمایی شده است. از طریق آزمایشات سخت، نشان می دهیم که رشته های ما به خوبی ارتباط دارند، با ارتباط استانداریسی قوی، با ۶ رشته های مختلف از منابع ساخته شده از انسان مشهور مانند WordNet، OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia و غیر از ۶ متریک استاندارد متفاوت است. ما همچنین ارتباط بین صفحه\u200cهای انسان را تصویر می\u200cکنیم و تحلیل می\u200cکنیم و مشاهده\u200cهای جالب انجام می\u200cدهیم. ارزشمند تولید از طریق ما توانایی نمونه\u200cبندی است، بدون هزینه اضافی، جمله\u200cهای متفاوتی از یک کلمه داده شده است. بالاخره، طبیعت کاملا ناپذیری از دسترسی ما آن را برای هر زبانی دریافت می کند. کد و داده\u200cها به طور عمومی در دسترس هستند https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .', 'bn': 'একটি প্রদত্ত শব্দ অথবা বহুলিশীল অনুভূতির সংখ্যা খুব বিশেষ ধারণা, যা বিভিন্ন বিষয়বস্তু এবং সম্পদের মধ্যে ব্যাপক ভিন্ন। We propose a novel method to estimate polysemy based on simple geometry in the contextual embedding space.  আমাদের পদক্ষেপ পুরোপুরি সংরক্ষিত এবং শুধুমাত্র তথ্য চালানো হয়েছে। গুরুত্বপূর্ণ পরীক্ষার মাধ্যমে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের রান্নাকারীরা ভালোভাবে সম্পর্কিত, শক্তিশালী পরিসংখ্যানের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, যাদের মধ্যে ৬টি বিখ্যাত মানুষের বিখ্ আমরা মানুষের রাঙ্কিং এর সম্পর্ক দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি এবং বিশ্লেষণ করি এবং কৌতূহলজনক পর্যবেক্ষণ করি। আমাদের পদ্ধতির মূল্যবান একটি নমুনা করার ক্ষমতা, বেশী খরচ না থাকার ক্ষমতা, যার বাক্যের মধ্যে একটি নির্দিষ্ট শব্দের বিভিন্ন অন অবশেষে, আমাদের পদক্ষেপের পুরোপুরি সংরক্ষিত প্রকৃতি এটাকে কোন ভাষায় প্রয়োজন করে। কোড এবং ডাটা প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যাচ্ছে https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment ...', 'ca': "El nombre de sentits d'una paraula dada, o polissima, és una noció molt subjectiva, que varia molt entre anotators i recursos. Proposem un mètode nou per estimar la polissimia basada en geometria senzilla a l'espai d'integració contextual. El nostre enfocament no està completament supervisat i només basat en dades. A través d'experiments rigorosos, demostram que les nostres classificacions estan ben correlacionades, amb forta importància estadística, amb 6 diferents classificacions derivades de famosos recursos humans construïts com WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia, etc., per 6 diferents mètriques estandards. We also visualize and analyze the correlation between the human rankings and make interesting observations.  Un producte secundari valiós del nostre mètode és l'habilitat de mostrar, sense cost extra, frases que contenen diferents sentits d'una paraula dada. Finalment, la naturalesa completament no supervisada del nostre enfocament la fa aplicable a qualsevol llenguatge. El codi i les dades estan disponibles al públic https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .", 'cs': 'Počet smyslů daného slova, neboli polysémie, je velmi subjektivní pojem, který se velmi liší mezi anotátory a zdroji. Navrhujeme novou metodu odhadu polysémie založenou na jednoduché geometrii v kontextuálním vkládacím prostoru. Náš přístup je plně bez dohledu a čistě datově řízený. Prostřednictvím přísných experimentů ukazujeme, že naše žebříčky jsou dobře korelované, se silnou statistickou významností, se šesti různými žebříčky odvozenými ze slavných lidských zdrojů, jako jsou WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia atd., pro šest různých standardních metrik. Dále vizualizujeme a analyzujeme korelaci mezi lidskými hodnoceními a děláme zajímavá pozorování. Cenným vedlejším produktem naší metody je možnost bez dodatečných nákladů vzorkovat věty obsahující různé smysly daného slova. A konečně, plně bez dohledu povaha našeho přístupu je aplikovatelná na jakýkoliv jazyk. Kód a údaje jsou veřejně dostupné https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment  .', 'bs': 'Broj čula određene riječi ili polizemije je vrlo subjektivna ideja, koja se široko razlikuje preko annotatora i resursa. Predlažemo novu metodu da procijenimo polizemiju baziranu na jednostavnoj geometriji u kontekstualnom ugrađenom prostoru. Naš pristup je potpuno neodređen i čisti podaci. Kroz teške eksperimente, pokazujemo da su naši redovi dobro povezani, sa jakim statističkim značajem, sa 6 različitih redova iz poznatih ljudskih resursa poput WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia, itd., za 6 različitih standardnih metrika. Također vizualiziramo i analiziramo povezanost između ljudskih redova i činimo zanimljive promatranja. Vrjedna po proizvodu našeg metoda je sposobnost uzorka bez dodatne cijene, rečenica koja sadrži različite čula određene riječi. Konačno, potpuno neodređena priroda našeg pristupa je primjenjiva na bilo koji jezik. Kod i podaci su javno dostupni https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment -Da.', 'et': 'Teatava sõna või polüseemia meelte arv on väga subjektiivne mõiste, mis erineb märgistajate ja ressursside lõikes väga palju. Pakume välja uudse meetodi polüseemia hindamiseks, mis põhineb lihtsal geomeetrial kontekstis manustamisruumis. Meie lähenemisviis on täielikult järelevalveta ja puhtalt andmepõhine. Tänu rangetele eksperimentidele näitame, et meie edetabelid on hästi korrelatsioonitud, tugeva statistilise tähtsusega, 6 erineva edetabeliga, mis on saadud kuulsatest inimressurssidest, nagu WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia jne, 6 erineva standardmõõdiku jaoks. Samuti visualiseerime ja analüüsime inimeste järjestuste vahelist korrelatsiooni ning teeme huvitavaid vaatlusi. Meie meetodi väärtuslik kõrvalsaadus on võime ilma lisatasuta proovida lauseid, mis sisaldavad antud sõna erinevaid meeli. Lõpetuseks, meie lähenemisviisi täielikult järelevalveta olemus muudab selle kohaldatavaks mis tahes keele suhtes. Kood ja andmed on avalikult kättesaadavad https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment  .', 'fi': 'Tietyn sanan aistien määrä, tai polysemia, on hyvin subjektiivinen käsite, joka vaihtelee suuresti merkintöjen ja resurssien välillä. Ehdotamme uutta menetelmää polysemian arviointiin, joka perustuu yksinkertaiseen geometriaan kontekstuaalisessa upotustilassa. Lähestymistapamme on täysin valvomatonta ja puhtaasti datalähtöistä. Tarkkojen kokeiden avulla osoitamme, että sijoituksemme korreloivat hyvin, ja niillä on vahva tilastollinen merkitys, 6 erilaista sijoitusta, jotka on johdettu kuuluisista ihmisen rakentamista resursseista, kuten WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia jne., 6 eri standardimittaria. Visualisoimme ja analysoimme myös ihmisten sijoitusten välistä korrelaatiota ja teemme mielenkiintoisia havaintoja. Menetelmämme arvokas sivutuote on kyky näytellä ilman lisäkustannuksia lauseita, jotka sisältävät tietyn sanan eri aisteja. Lopuksi totean, että lähestymistapamme on täysin valvomaton, joten sitä voidaan soveltaa mihin tahansa kieleen. Koodi ja tiedot ovat julkisesti saatavilla https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment  .', 'az': 'Verilən sözün, ya da polizaminin hisslərin sayısı çox subjektiv bir fikirdir. Bu, annotator və kaynaqlar arasında genişlənir. Biz bir yeni metod təklif edirik ki, çox basit geometriyə dayandırılır. Bizim yaxınlığımız tamamilə müdafiə edilməz və təmiz məlumat sürüklənmiş. Qüvvətli təcrübələr vasitəsilə, səviyyələrimizin çox yaxşı, güclü statistik anlamıyla, WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia və ya da altı müxtəlif standart metrikləri kimi məşhur insan inşa edilmiş kaynaqlarından 6 müxtəlif səviyyələr vardır. Biz də insan səviyyələri arasındakı bağlantıları görünür və analiz edirik və ilginç gözləyirik. Bizim metodumuzun qiymətli müxtəlif təhsil, əlavə etdiyimiz sözlərin müxtəlif hissləri barəsində nümunə çəkməyə qadirdir. Sonunda, bizim yaxınlığımızın tamamlanmadığı təbiəti hər bir dilə uyğunlaşdırır. Kod və verilər açıq-aşkar faydalanır https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .', 'jv': 'Daftar kesempakan ning langgar, polisemi, akeh podho kapan ngono kuwi, sing gayut terus tambah karo ngono koyok barang We proposal a new method to assess Isosé awak dhéwé kuwi ora bisa perusahaan lan barang-barang data yang diputuhke Ato hal-hal sing dadi sing perbudhakan, kita sembarang kelas teléhku nggawe rangkeng dibujak, karo sekang dadi sing dadi sabên, karo 6 ulih rangkeng liyane sing dipulangan karo perbudhakan podho akhar arkane sing koyra Word net, OntNoti, Oxford êr, Wipediya, lan dadi 6 ulih padha metika. Awakdhéwé éntuk ngerasakno karo perusahaan nggawe gerakan karo perusahaan anyar tentang karo perusahaan winih lan ngono perusahaan anyar Wujaring Sokaké, nggo ngerasai bener-bener sing gak bener tentang kanggo nguasai tindang. Coverage https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .', 'ha': 'Kijan sanyin wata kalma da aka ba shi, ko kuwa na musammi, yana da wani idãna mai inganci mai girma, wanda yana sãɓã wa tsakanin matalauta da resource. Tune buɗe wani hanyor node zuwa a ƙaddara mulki a kan wani geometri mai sauƙi a cikin filin da ke shiga a yanzu. Ga hanyõyinmu an tsare shi da kuma ba da wani abu ba wanda aka yi ba. Daga jarrabai masu riga, Munã nũna wa rankasiyarmu masu da giraffe, kuma sunã da muhimmin statistic mai ƙarfi, da 6 dabam-dabam na dabam-dabam daga manyan da aka ƙididdige shi, kamar wordNet, OntoNotes, Oxfur, Wikiedia, da kuma daban 6 dabam-dabam. Kayya, muna gani da analyza ma\'abũcin mutane da za\'a samar da gannai mai kyãwo. Kima da kiimar da shirin hanyonmu yana iya iya sami, kuma bã da wani abu ba mai ƙara ba, da maganar da ke ƙunsa da sanyin daban-daban. Haƙari, mazan da ba\'a tsare na hanyarmu ba yana da amfani da duk harshe. Ana sami kode da data https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment Ya ce: "Yã ku mutãne!', 'sk': 'Število čutov določene besede ali polikemije je zelo subjektiven pojem, ki se zelo razlikuje med označevalci in viri. Predlagamo novo metodo ocenjevanja polisemije, ki temelji na preprosti geometriji v kontekstnem prostoru vgradnje. Naš pristop je popolnoma nenadzorovan in temelji zgolj na podatkih. S strogimi eksperimenti pokažemo, da so naše lestvice dobro povezane, z močno statistično pomembnostjo, s 6 različnimi lestvicami, ki izhajajo iz znanih človeških virov, kot so WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia itd., za 6 različnih standardnih metrik. Prav tako vizualiziramo in analiziramo korelacijo med človeškimi lestvicami ter naredimo zanimiva opazovanja. Dragocen stranski produkt naše metode je sposobnost brez dodatnih stroškov vzorčenja stavkov, ki vsebujejo različne čute določene besede. Nazadnje, zaradi popolnoma nenadzorovane narave našega pristopa se uporablja za vsak jezik. Koda in podatki so javno dostopni https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment  .', 'he': 'The number of senses of a given word, or polysemy, is a very subjective notion, which varies widely across annotators and resources.  We propose a novel method to estimate polysemy based on simple geometry in the contextual embedding space.  Our approach is fully unsupervised and purely data-driven.  באמצעות ניסויים קשים, אנו מראים שהציונים שלנו מקושרים היטב, עם חשיבות סטטיסטית חזקה, עם 6 ציונים שונים שנוצרים משאבים בנויים אנושיים מפורסמים כמו וורדנט, אונטונוטס, אוקספורד, ויקיפדיה, וכו"כ, עבור 6 מטריות סטנדרטיות שונות. אנחנו גם מדמיינים ונבחנים את הקשר בין הדרגות האנושיות ולעשות צפיות מעניינות. תוצר לוואי ערך של השיטה שלנו הוא היכולת לדוגמא, ללא מחיר נוסף, משפטים שמכילים חושים שונים של מילה מסוימת. סוף סוף, הטבע הלא משגיח לגמרי של הגישה שלנו גורם לזה להתאים לכל שפה. קוד ומידע זמינים לציבור https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment -כן.', 'bo': 'བྱིན་ཡོད་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་དང་སྡུད་ཆེན་དག་གི་གྲངས་ཀ་དེ་དམིགས་བསལ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན། We propose a novel method to estimate polysemy based on simple geometry in the contextual embedding space. ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་འདི་ནི་ཆ་ཚང་མ་སླེབས་བྱས་མེད་པར་ཐལ་ཡོད་པས། Through rigorous experiments, we show that our rankings are well correlated, with strong statistical significance, with 6 different rankings derived from famous human-constructed resources such as WordNet, OntoNotes, Oxford, Wikipedia, etc., for 6 different standard metrics. ང་ཚོས་མིའི་གོ་རིམ་དང་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་མཐུན་ཐལ་ནས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གྱི་བྱ་རིམ་གྱི་རིན་ཐང་དག་ནི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་རྩིས་ཐུབ་སྐྱེལ་མ་རེད། ཚིག་རྟགས་ཀྱིས་བྱས་པའི་ཚིག་རྟགས་ མཐའ་མར་དུ། ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཚང་མ་ཡོད་པ་དེ་ནི་སྐད་རིགས་གང་ཞིག་ལ་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་བྱེད་ཐ སྤྱི་ཚོགས་སྤྱོད་པའི་ཨང་དང་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་མང་ཙམ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ https://github.com/ksipos/polysemy-assessment .'}
{'en': 'Disfluency Correction using Unsupervised and Semi-supervised Learning', 'es': 'Corrección de la disfluencia mediante aprendizaje no supervisado y semisupervisado', 'ar': 'تصحيح عدم الطلاقة باستخدام التعلم غير الخاضع للإشراف وشبه الإشراف', 'fr': "Correction de la disfluence grâce à l'apprentissage non supervisé et semi-supervisé", 'pt': 'Correção de Disfluência usando Aprendizado Não Supervisionado e Semissupervisionado', 'hi': 'Unsupervised और अर्ध पर्यवेक्षित सीखने का उपयोग कर Disfluency सुधार', 'ja': '非監督型および半監督型学習を使用した不流動性コレクション', 'zh': '用无监督及半督学不流畅性校正', 'ru': 'Коррекция несплошности с использованием неконтролируемого и полуконтролируемого обучения', 'ga': 'Ceartú Easpaigin ag baint úsáide as Foghlaim gan Mhaoirseacht agus Leath-mhaoirseacht', 'hu': 'Diszfluencia korrekció felügyelet nélküli és félig felügyelt tanulással', 'ka': 'განსხვავებული კონფიგურაცია გამოყენებული არსხვავებული და ნახევარჯერი სწავლების გამოყენება', 'it': "Correzione della disfluenza utilizzando l'apprendimento non supervisionato e semi supervisionato", 'kk': 'Бақыламаған және жарты бақыламаған оқыту көмегімен бөлшектерді түзету', 'el': 'Διόρθωση ανωμαλίας με τη χρήση μη εποπτευόμενης και ημιεποπτευόμενης μάθησης', 'ms': 'Pembetulan Kecacatan menggunakan Pempelajaran Tidak Dijaga dan Semi-Dijaga', 'mk': 'Disfluency Correction using Unsupervised and Semi-supervised Learning', 'ml': 'നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത വിദ്യാഭ്യാസം പരിശോധിക്കുക', 'mn': 'Хамгаалахгүй, хагас ажиглагдаагүй суралцах', 'pl': 'Korekta niepłynności przy użyciu uczenia się nienadzorowanego i pół-nadzorowanego', 'lt': 'Nuotekų korekcija naudojant nepastebimą ir pusiau prižiūrimą mokymąsi', 'mt': 'Korrezzjoni tad-Disfluwenza bl-użu ta’ Tagħlim Mhux Sorveljat u Semissorveljat', 'si': 'අපරිස්ථාවක් නැති සහ අධ්\u200dයාවක් පරිස්ථාවක් ඉගෙනගන්න', 'so': 'hagaajinta iskuulka ee isticmaalka waxbarashada', 'no': 'Korreksjon av forskyvingskorreksjon ved hjelp av læring utan uskyvinga og halvoversikt', 'ta': 'கண்காணிக்கப்படாத மற்றும் பாது கண்காணிக்கப்படாத கல்வியை பயன்படுத்தி திருத்தம்', 'ro': 'Corectarea disfluenței utilizând învățarea nesupravegheată și semi-supravegheată', 'sr': 'Korekcija nestabilnosti koristeći neodržavano i polovično nadzirano učenje', 'ur': 'ناپاکیزگی اصلاح ناپاکیزہ اور نصف نظارت کی تعلیم کے مطابق', 'sv': 'Diskussionskorrektion med hjälp av oövervakat och halvövervakat lärande', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Dịch sai khi dùng giáo dục không giám sát và giám sát', 'nl': 'Correctie van stoornissen met behulp van niet-begeleid en semi-begeleid leren', 'da': 'Diskussionskorrektion ved hjælp af ukontrolleret og halvovervåget læring', 'hr': 'Korekcija nestabilnosti koristeći neodržavano i polovično nadzirano učenje', 'de': 'Fehlerkorrektur durch unbeaufsichtigtes und halbüberwachtes Lernen', 'id': 'Koreksi Kecacatan menggunakan Belajar Tak Tersupervisi dan Semi-supervised', 'fa': 'تغییر تغییر تغییر از استفاده از یادگیری غیرقابل حفاظت و نیم حفاظت', 'bg': 'Корекция на дисфлуанса чрез неконтролирано и полунадзорно обучение', 'sw': 'Uharibifu wa usawa kwa kutumia Elimu isiyoangaliwa na Kufuatiliwa', 'af': 'Disfluidingskorreksie gebruik Ononderwerpende en Semi-onderwerpende Leer', 'ko': '무감독과 반감독 학습에 기초한 불유창한 교정', 'hy': 'Անվտանգության ուղղությունը օգտագործելով անվերահսկված և կես-վերահսկված ուսումնասիրություն', 'tr': 'Saklanmadan we Üç Gözlemli öwrenmek kullanarak küçük düzenleme', 'bn': 'অনভারওয়ার্ড এবং সেমি নজরদারী শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করে ব্যবস্থা সংশোধন', 'sq': 'Korrektimi i Disfluency duke përdorur Mësimin e Pambikqyrur dhe Gjysmë-mbikqyrur', 'am': 'CategoryName', 'ca': 'Correcció de la disfluència utilitzant aprenentatge no supervisat i semisupervisat', 'bs': 'Korekcija nestabilnosti koristeći neodržavano i polovično nadzirano učenje', 'et': 'Häirete korrigeerimine järelevalveta ja pooljuhitatud õppe abil', 'fi': 'Häiriöiden korjaus valvomattomalla ja puolivalvotulla oppimisella', 'az': 'Qeyd edilməmiş və yarı gözləməmiş öyrənməyi kullanarak fəsad düzəltməsi', 'cs': 'Korekce neslušnosti pomocí nekontrolovaného a polovičně dozorovaného učení', 'jv': 'Ngubah Ukuran', 'sk': 'Popravljanje motenj z uporabo nenadzorovanega in polnadzorovanega učenja', 'he': 'תיקון מחלות בשימוש ללימודים לא מפקחים וחצי מפקחים', 'ha': 'Disfluency Correction using Unsupervised and Semi-supervised Learning', 'bo': 'རྒྱུན་ལྡན་མེད་པའི་སྐོར་དང་ལུང་བསྒྱུར་བའི་ཤེས་ཚད་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པའི་འགྱུར་གཙང་དག་བཟོ་བ'}
{'en': 'Spoken language is different from the written language in its style and structure. Disfluencies that appear in transcriptions from speech recognition systems generally hamper the performance of downstream NLP tasks. Thus, a disfluency correction system that converts disfluent to fluent text is of great value. This paper introduces a disfluency correction model that translates disfluent to fluent text by drawing inspiration from recent encoder-decoder unsupervised style-transfer models for text. We also show considerable benefits in performance when utilizing a small sample of 500 parallel disfluent-fluent sentences in a semi-supervised way. Our unsupervised approach achieves a BLEU score of 79.39 on the Switchboard corpus test set, with further improvement to a BLEU score of 85.28 with semi-supervision. Both are comparable to two competitive fully-supervised models.', 'fr': "Le style et la structure de la langue parlée diffèrent de la langue écrite. Les disfluences qui apparaissent dans les transcriptions des systèmes de reconnaissance vocale entravent généralement l'exécution des tâches de PNL en aval. Ainsi, un système de correction de disfluence qui convertit le texte disfluent en texte fluide est d'une grande utilité. Cet article présente un modèle de correction de disfluence qui traduit le texte disfluent en texte fluide en s'inspirant des modèles récents de transfert de style non supervisé codeur-décodeur pour le texte. Nous démontrons également des avantages considérables en termes de performance lorsque nous utilisons un petit échantillon de 500 phrases disfluentes parallèles de manière semi-supervisée. Notre approche non supervisée atteint un score BLEU de 79,39 sur l'ensemble de tests de corpus Switchboard, avec une amélioration supplémentaire à un score BLEU de 85,28 avec semi-supervision. Les deux sont comparables à deux modèles concurrents entièrement supervisés.", 'es': 'La lengua hablada es diferente de la lengua escrita en su estilo y estructura. Las disfluencias que aparecen en las transcripciones de los sistemas de reconocimiento de voz generalmente dificultan el desempeño de las tareas de PNL posteriores. Por lo tanto, un sistema de corrección de la disfluencia que convierte el texto no fluido en texto fluido es de gran valor. Este artículo presenta un modelo de corrección de disfluencia que traduce texto no fluido a texto fluido inspirándose en modelos recientes de transferencia de estilo sin supervisión de codificadores-decodificadores para texto. También mostramos beneficios considerables en el rendimiento al utilizar una pequeña muestra de 500 oraciones paralelas con fluidez disfluente de forma semisupervisada. Nuestro enfoque no supervisado logra una puntuación BLEU de 79.39 en el conjunto de pruebas de corpus de Switchboard, con una mejora adicional a una puntuación BLEU de 85.28 con semisupervisión. Ambos son comparables a dos modelos competitivos totalmente supervisados.', 'ar': 'تختلف اللغة المحكية عن اللغة المكتوبة في أسلوبها وبنيتها. تؤدي حالات عدم التوافق التي تظهر في النسخ من أنظمة التعرف على الكلام إلى إعاقة أداء مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية في نهاية المطاف. وبالتالي ، فإن نظام تصحيح عدم الطلاقة الذي يحول غير المطلق إلى نص بطلاقة له قيمة كبيرة. تقدم هذه الورقة نموذجًا لتصحيح عدم الطلاقة يترجم غير المطلق إلى نص بطلاقة من خلال استلهام الإلهام من نماذج نقل النص غير الخاضعة للرقابة في وحدة فك التشفير والتشفير الحديثة. نظهر أيضًا فوائد كبيرة في الأداء عند استخدام عينة صغيرة من 500 جملة متوازية غير طليقة بطلاقة بطريقة شبه خاضعة للإشراف. حقق نهجنا غير الخاضع للإشراف درجة BLEU البالغة 79.39 في مجموعة اختبار لوحة التبديل ، مع مزيد من التحسين لدرجة BLEU البالغة 85.28 مع شبه إشراف. كلاهما يمكن مقارنته بنموذجين تنافسيين خاضعين للإشراف الكامل.', 'pt': 'A linguagem falada é diferente da linguagem escrita em seu estilo e estrutura. Disfluências que aparecem em transcrições de sistemas de reconhecimento de fala geralmente prejudicam o desempenho de tarefas de PNL downstream. Assim, um sistema de correção de disfluência que converta texto disfluente em fluente é de grande valia. Este artigo apresenta um modelo de correção de disfluência que traduz texto disfluente para fluente, inspirando-se em modelos recentes de transferência de estilo não supervisionada de codificador-decodificador para texto. Também mostramos benefícios consideráveis no desempenho ao utilizar uma pequena amostra de 500 sentenças paralelas disfluentes-fluentes de forma semi-supervisionada. Nossa abordagem não supervisionada atinge uma pontuação BLEU de 79,39 no conjunto de testes de corpus do painel de controle, com melhorias adicionais para uma pontuação BLEU de 85,28 com semi-supervisão. Ambos são comparáveis a dois modelos competitivos totalmente supervisionados.', 'ja': '口語は、そのスタイルと構造において、書かれた言語とは異なります。音声認識システムからの転写に現れる不流動は、一般に、下流のNLPタスクのパフォーマンスを妨げる。したがって、不流動的なテキストを流動的なテキストに変換する不流動性補正システムは、非常に価値がある。本論文では、最近のエンコーダ-デコーダの監督されていないスタイル転送モデルからインスピレーションを得て、不流暢なテキストを流動的なテキストに変換する不流動性補正モデルを紹介した。また、500の並列不流動文の小さなサンプルを半監督的に利用すると、パフォーマンスにかなりの利点があります。当社の無監督アプローチは、スイッチボードコーパステストセットで79.39のBLEUスコアを達成し、半監督で85.28のBLEUスコアにさらに改善します。どちらも2つの完全に監督された競合モデルに匹敵します。', 'zh': '口语风格与结构与书面语言不同。 语音识别系统转录不流常妨下流 NLP 任。 是以转不流之本为流本之不流,正统为重。 本文引一不畅校正模形,从近文本编码器-解码器无监督式传输取灵感,将不畅文本转为流畅文本。 当以半监用500并行之小样本,犹见大益于性也。 臣等无监督之法于 Switchboard 语料库集上得 79.39 BLEU分,于半监试集下进一步提高至 85.28 之BLEU分。 两者俱与两竞。', 'hi': 'बोली जाने वाली भाषा अपनी शैली और संरचना में लिखित भाषा से अलग है। भाषण पहचान प्रणालियों से प्रतिलेखन में दिखाई देने वाली अव्यवस्थाएं आमतौर पर डाउनस्ट्रीम एनएलपी कार्यों के प्रदर्शन में बाधा डालती हैं। इस प्रकार, एक disfluency सुधार प्रणाली है कि धाराप्रवाह पाठ के लिए disfluent परिवर्तित महान मूल्य का है. यह पेपर एक डिस्फ्लुएंसी सुधार मॉडल का परिचय देता है जो पाठ के लिए हाल ही में एन्कोडर-डिकोडर असुरक्षित शैली-स्थानांतरण मॉडल से प्रेरणा लेकर धाराप्रवाह पाठ में डिस्फ्लुएंट का अनुवाद करता है। हम एक अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित तरीके से 500 समानांतर डिस्फ्लुएंट-धाराप्रवाह वाक्यों के एक छोटे से नमूने का उपयोग करते समय प्रदर्शन में काफी लाभ भी दिखाते हैं। हमारा असुरक्षित दृष्टिकोण स्विचबोर्ड कॉर्पस टेस्ट सेट पर 79.39 का BLEU स्कोर प्राप्त करता है, जिसमें अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षण के साथ 85.28 के BLEU स्कोर में और सुधार होता है। दोनों दो प्रतिस्पर्धी पूरी तरह से पर्यवेक्षित मॉडल के लिए तुलनीय हैं।', 'ru': 'Говорящий язык отличается от письменного стилем и структурой. Недостатки, которые появляются в транскрипциях из систем распознавания речи, как правило, препятствуют выполнению последующих задач NLP. Таким образом, система коррекции вытеснения, которая преобразует вытесненный текст в свободный, имеет большую ценность. В этой статье представлена модель коррекции вытеснения, которая переводит вытесненный текст в свободный, черпая вдохновение из недавних моделей неконтролируемой передачи стиля кодировщика-декодера для текста. Мы также демонстрируем значительные преимущества в производительности при использовании небольшой выборки из 500 параллельных предложений, выходящих из потока, полунадзорным способом. Наш неконтролируемый подход достигает балла BLEU 79,39 на тестовом наборе корпуса распределительного щита, с дальнейшим улучшением до балла BLEU 85,28 с полунадзором. Оба сопоставимы с двумя конкурентоспособными полностью контролируемыми моделями.', 'ga': 'Tá an teanga labhartha difriúil ón teanga scríofa ina stíl agus ina struchtúr. Go ginearálta cuireann easnaimh a fheictear i dtras-scríbhinní ó chórais aitheantais cainte bac ar fheidhmiú tascanna NLP iartheachtacha. Mar sin, tá luach an-mhór ag baint le córas ceartúcháin eisilteachta a thiontaíonn easilteach go téacs líofa. Tugann an páipéar seo isteach múnla ceartúcháin easláinte a aistríonn eisilteach go téacs líofa trí inspioráid a fháil ó mhúnlaí aistrithe stíle gan maoirsiú ionchódóra-díchódóra le déanaí le haghaidh téacs. Léirímid freisin buntáistí suntasacha maidir le feidhmíocht agus sampla beag de 500 abairt comhthreomhar eas-líofa á úsáid againn ar bhealach leath-mhaoirsithe. Tá scór BLEU de 79.39 á bhaint amach ag ár gcur chuige gan mhaoirseacht ar thacar tástála corpais an Lasc-Chláir, le feabhsú breise go dtí scór BLEU de 85.28 le leathmhaoirseacht. Tá an dá mhúnla inchomparáide le dhá mhúnla iomaíoch faoi mhaoirseacht iomlán.', 'hu': 'A beszélt nyelv stílusában és struktúrájában különbözik az írott nyelvtől. A beszédfelismerő rendszerekből származó átiratokban megjelenő zavarok általában gátolják a downstream NLP feladatok teljesítését. Ezért nagy értékű egy diszfluencia korrekciós rendszer, amely a diszfluenciát folyékony szövegre konvertálja. Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a diszfluencia korrekciós modellt, amely a diszfluencia korrekcióját folyékony szövegre fordítja, mert inspirációt merít a legújabb kódoló-dekóder felügyelet nélküli stílusátviteli modellekből a szöveghez. Jelentős előnyöket mutatunk a teljesítményben, ha 500 párhuzamos diszfolyékony mondatból álló kis mintát használunk félig felügyelt módon. Felügyelet nélküli megközelítésünk 79,39 BLEU pontszámot ér el a Switchboard corpus tesztkészleten, és további 85,28 BLEU pontszámot ér el félfelügyelet mellett. Mindkettő hasonlítható két versenyképes, teljes körűen felügyelt modellhez.', 'ka': 'სტრუქტურის და სტრუქტურის წერილიდან განსხვავებულია. განსხვავებები, რომლებიც ტრანსპრექტირებში გამოჩვენებულია სისტემების განაცნობის სისტემიდან, რომელიც განსხვავებული NLP დავაკეთებების გამოსახულებას უნდა ამიტომ, განსხვავებული კონფიგურაციის სისტემი, რომელიც განსხვავებული ტექსტის გადაცვლა დიდი მნიშვნელობაში. ამ დოკუმენტის შეცდომა შეცდომა შეცდომა მოდელი, რომელიც ტექსტისთვის შეცდომა ტექსტისთვის შეცდომა შეცდომა შეცდომა, რომელიც ტექსტისთვის შეცდომა შეცდომა ჩვენ ასევე მნიშვნელოვანი გამოსახულებების გამოყენება, როდესაც 500 პარალელური განსხვავებული ფუნქციენტი სიტყვების პარალელური გამოსახულებელი გამოყენებაში. ჩვენი არაფერიზებული პროგრამის მიღება 79,39 წერტილის ბლესონის წერტილი შვიფბორდის კორპუსს ტესტის შესახებ, რომელიც უფრო მეტად უფრო მეტადება ბლესონის 85,28 წერტილის ნახევა ორივე შემდგომარებელია ორივე კონკენტებური ყველაფერად მოდელთან.', 'kk': 'Таңдау тілі жазылған тілінен стиль мен құрылымында әртүрлі. Транскриптерде сөздерді анықтау жүйелерінен көрсетілген бөлімдері әдетте NLP тапсырмаларының істеуін көмектеседі. Бұл үшін, бұлдығын бұлдық мәтінде аударатын бұлдығын түзету жүйесі үлкен мәні. Бұл қағаз жаңа кодер- декодердің жаңа мәтіннің стиль аудару үлгілерінен алдын- ақпаратты түзету үлгісін көрсетеді. Сонымен қатар, 500 параллелі бұл параллелді бұл сөздерді жарты бақылау тәртібімен қолданғанда жұмыс істеу үшін маңызды пайдаланушыларды көрсетедік. Біздің бағытталмаған тәсіліміз Швейцариялық корпус сынақтарында 79,39 BLEU нәтижесін жеткізеді, бұл жерде 85,28 BLEU нәтижесін жартық бақылау үшін жақсы жақсартылады. Екі жағдай екі жағдайымды толық қарау үлгілерімен салыстырылады.', 'el': 'Η ομιλούμενη γλώσσα διαφέρει από τη γραπτή γλώσσα στο ύφος και τη δομή της. Οι διαταραχές που εμφανίζονται στις μεταγραφές από συστήματα αναγνώρισης ομιλίας γενικά εμποδίζουν την εκτέλεση των μεταγενέστερων εργασιών NLP. Έτσι, ένα σύστημα διόρθωσης ακαμψίας που μετατρέπει άπταιστο σε άπταιστο κείμενο είναι μεγάλης αξίας. Η παρούσα εργασία εισάγει ένα μοντέλο διόρθωσης ακαμψίας που μεταφράζει άπταιστο σε άπταιστο κείμενο αντλώντας έμπνευση από πρόσφατα μοντέλα μεταφοράς στυλ κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή χωρίς επίβλεψη για κείμενο. Παρουσιάζουμε επίσης σημαντικά οφέλη στην απόδοση όταν χρησιμοποιούμε ένα μικρό δείγμα 500 παράλληλων άπταιστων προτάσεων με ημι-εποπτικό τρόπο. Η προσέγγισή μας χωρίς επίβλεψη επιτυγχάνει βαθμολογία 79.39 στο σετ δοκιμών σωμάτων του πίνακα μεταγραφής, με περαιτέρω βελτίωση σε βαθμολογία 85.28 με ημιεπιτήρηση. Και τα δύο είναι συγκρίσιμα με δύο ανταγωνιστικά μοντέλα πλήρους εποπτείας.', 'mk': 'Зборуваниот јазик е различен од напишаниот јазик во неговиот стил и структура. Неуспешностите кои се појавуваат во транскриптите од системите за препознавање на говорот генерално го попречуваат извршувањето на понатамошните задачи на НЛП. Така, системот за корекција на растојанието кој го претвора растојанието во текст е од голема вредност. Оваа хартија претставува модел за корекција на дифленцијата кој преведува дифленцијата во текст со цртање инспирација од неодамнешните модели за пренесување на стил на кодер- декодер за текст. Исто така, покажуваме значителни бенефиции во резултатите кога користиме мал примерок од 500 паралелни реченици со течни реченици на полунадгледуван начин. Нашиот ненадгледуван пристап постигнува БЛЕУ оценка од 79,39 на тестот Switchboard corpus, со понатамошно подобрување на БЛЕУ оценка од 85,28 со полунадзор. Двајцата се споредливи со двата конкурентни целосно надгледувани модели.', 'ms': 'Bahasa bercakap berbeza dari bahasa tertulis dalam gaya dan strukturnya. Kecacatan yang muncul dalam transkripsi dari sistem pengenalan ucapan biasanya menghalang prestasi tugas NLP turun. Oleh itu, sistem penyesuaian yang mengubah penyesuaian ke teks yang penyesuaian adalah nilai yang besar. Kertas ini memperkenalkan model penyesuaian kelemahan yang menerjemahkan kelemahan ke teks kelemahan dengan melukis inspirasi dari model pemindahan gaya pengekod-dekoder baru-baru ini untuk teks. Kami juga menunjukkan keuntungan yang besar dalam prestasi apabila menggunakan sampel kecil dari 500 kalimat fluent-fluent selari dalam cara semi-mengawasi. pendekatan kita yang tidak diawasi mencapai skor BLEU 79.39 pada set ujian korpus Switchboard, dengan peningkatan lanjut ke skor BLEU 85.28 dengan setengah pengawasan. Kedua-duanya boleh dibandingkan dengan dua model yang diawasi sepenuhnya.', 'it': 'La lingua parlata è diversa dalla lingua scritta nel suo stile e struttura. Disfluenze che appaiono nelle trascrizioni dai sistemi di riconoscimento vocale in genere ostacolano lo svolgimento delle attività NLP a valle. Pertanto, un sistema di correzione della disfluenza che converte il disfluente in testo fluente è di grande valore. Questo articolo introduce un modello di correzione della disfluenza che traduce il disfluente in testo fluente traendo ispirazione dai recenti modelli di trasferimento di stile non supervisionati di encoder-decoder per il testo. Mostriamo anche notevoli vantaggi in termini di prestazioni quando utilizziamo un piccolo campione di 500 frasi parallele fluenti in modo semi-supervisionato. Il nostro approccio non supervisionato raggiunge un punteggio BLEU di 79,39 sul set di test Switchboard corpus, con un ulteriore miglioramento a un punteggio BLEU di 85,28 con semi-supervisione. Entrambi sono paragonabili a due modelli competitivi pienamente controllati.', 'mt': 'Il-lingwa mitkellma hija differenti mil-lingwa miktuba fl-istil u l-istruttura tagħha. Id-diskrepanzi li jidhru fit-traskrizzjonijiet minn sistemi ta’ rikonoxximent tad-diskors ġeneralment ifixklu t-twettiq ta’ kompiti downstream tal-NLP. Għalhekk, sistema ta’ korrezzjoni tad-disfluwenza li tikkonverti d-disfluwenza għal test fluwenti hija ta’ valur kbir. Dan id-dokument jintroduċi mudell ta’ korrezzjoni tad-diskrepanza li jittraduċi test diskrepanti għal test fluwenti billi tiġbed ispirazzjoni minn mudelli riċenti ta’ trasferiment tal-istil mhux sorveljati tal-kodifikatur-dekoder għat-test. Aħna nuru wkoll benefiċċji konsiderevoli fil-prestazzjoni meta nużaw kampjun żgħir ta’ 500 sentenza parallel a bi flussi ta’ fluss b’mod semi-sorveljat. L-approċċ mhux sorveljat tagħna jilħaq punteġġ BLEU ta’ 79.39 fuq is-sett tat-test Switchboard corpus, b’aktar titjib għal punteġġ BLEU ta’ 85.28 b’semisuperviżjoni. It-tnejn huma komparabbli ma’ żewġ mudelli kompetittivi b’superviżjoni sħiħa.', 'mn': 'Гол хэл нь бичигдсэн хэл болон бүтцийн хэлбэрээс ялгаатай. Боловсролын хүлээн зөвшөөрүүлэх системээс харагдаж буй ялгаа нь нийтлэг NLP үйл ажиллагааны үйл ажиллагааг зогсоож чаддаг. Тиймээс, буруу шингэн текст руу шилжүүлэх буруу засах систем бол маш их утгатай. Энэ цаас нь саяхан коддогч-онгоцоос урам зориулж буй хэлбэрийн шилжүүлэх загварын загварыг танилцуулдаг. Мөн бид 500 параллель шингэн үлгээний жижиг жижиг жишээг ашиглах үед ажиллагаанд маш их ашиг үзүүлдэг. Бидний дэмжигдэхгүй арга баримт Швейцарийн корпус шалгалт дээр 79.39 BLEU оноо гарч ирнэ. БЛЕУ-ын 85.28 оноо нь хагас найдвартай. Хоёр хоёр нь өрсөлдөөнийг бүрэн удирдлагатай хоёр загвартай харьцуулдаг.', 'no': 'Spokkespråk er ulike frå skrivespråket i stilen og strukturen sin. Forskjellingar som dukkar opp i transkriptar frå tale-gjenkjenningssystemet vanlegvis hindrar utføringen av nedstrekke NLP-oppgåver. Derfor er ein korrigeringssystem for disfluency som konverterer disfluent til flytande tekst med stor verdi. Denne papiret introduserer ein forskyvingskorrigeringsmodell som omformar forskyvingsteksten ved å teikna inspirasjon frå nyleg koderingsmodeller for tekst som ikkje er uskyvingste stiloverføringar. Vi viser også mykje fordel i utviklinga når du bruker eit liten prøve av 500 parallelle forskyving-fluent setningar på ein halvoversikt måte. Vårt ungoppretta tilnærming oppnår ein BLEU-score av 79,39 på Sveitsbord-korpus-testet, med fleire forbetringar til ein BLEU-score av 85,28 med semioversikt. Begge er samanlikbar med to konkurentære fullstendige modeller.', 'pl': 'Język mówiony różni się od języka pisanego stylem i strukturą. Zaburzenia występujące w transkrypcjach z systemów rozpoznawania mowy ogólnie utrudniają wykonywanie dalszych zadań NLP. Tak więc system korekcji niepłynności, który konwertuje niepłynny tekst na płynny, ma dużą wartość. W artykule wprowadzono model korekcji niepłynności, który przekłada niepłynny na płynny tekst, czerpiąc inspirację z najnowszych modeli kodera-dekodera bez nadzoru stylu-transferu tekstu. Wykazujemy również znaczne korzyści w zakresie wydajności przy wykorzystaniu małej próbki 500 równoległych niepłynnych zdań w sposób pół-nadzorowany. Nasze podejście bez nadzoru osiąga wynik BLEU 79,39 na zestawie testowym korpusu Switchboard, z dalszą poprawą do wyniku BLEU 85,28 z półnadzorem. Oba są porównywalne do dwóch konkurencyjnych modeli w pełni nadzorowanych.', 'ro': 'Limba vorbită este diferită de limba scrisă în stilul și structura sa. Disfluențele care apar în transcrierile din sistemele de recunoaștere a vorbirii împiedică în general îndeplinirea sarcinilor PNL din aval. Astfel, un sistem de corecție a disfluenței care convertește disfluența în text fluent este de mare valoare. Această lucrare prezintă un model de corecție a disfluenței care traduce textul disfluent în fluent, inspirându-se din modele recente de codare-decodor nesupravegheate de transfer de stil pentru text. De asemenea, prezentăm beneficii considerabile în performanță atunci când utilizăm un eșantion mic de 500 de propoziții paralele disfluente-fluente într-un mod semi-supravegheat. Abordarea noastră nesupravegheată obține un scor BLEU de 79,39 pe setul de teste corpus Switchboard, cu îmbunătățiri suplimentare la un scor BLEU de 85,28 cu semi-supraveghere. Ambele sunt comparabile cu două modele competitive complet supravegheate.', 'lt': 'Kalbėta kalba skiriasi nuo rašytinės kalbos savo stiliu ir struktūra. Iš kalbos pripažinimo sistemų transkripcijose atsirandantys trūkumai paprastai trukdo vykdyti tolesnes NLP užduotis. Taigi nuotekų koregavimo sistema, kuri paverčia nuotekų skystą tekstą, yra didelė vertė. Šiame dokumente pateikiamas trūkumų koregavimo modelis, kuris verta trūkumų į trūkumų tekstą, įkvėpiant iš neseniai atliktų koduotojo-dekoderio nepastebimų stilių perdavimo modelių tekstui. Taip pat rodome didelę naudą rezultatams, kai pusiau prižiūrint naudojame mažą 500 lygiagrečių nuotekų nuotekų sankcijų mėginį. Mūsų nepastebimas metodas sukuria 79,39 BLEU rezultatą Switchboard corpus bandymų rinkinyje ir toliau pagerina 85,28 BLEU rezultatą su puspriežiūra. Both are comparable to two competitive fully-supervised models.', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ അതിന്റെ രീതിയിലും ഘടനയിലും എഴുതിയ ഭാഷ വ്യത്യസ്തമാണ്. സംസാരം തിരിച്ചറിയുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം സംവിധാനങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്ന് പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുന്ന വിഷയങ്ങള്\u200d സാധാരണ NLP ജോലികളുടെ പ അതുകൊണ്ട്, തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന പദാവലിയിലേക്ക് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്ന ഒരു തിരിച്ചറിപ്പ് സിസ്റ്റം വളരെ വലി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നത് പാഠത്തിനുള്ള അടുത്തുള്ള കോഡെര്\u200d ഡെക്കോഡെറില്\u200d നിന്നും സൂക്ഷിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത ശൈലി- മാറ്റം മോഡലു പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ചെറിയ ഉപദേശങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d വലിയ ഉപകാരങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. സ്വിച്ച്ബോര്\u200dഡ് കോര്\u200dപ്സ് സെറ്റ് സെറ്റില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ സൂക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത സ്കോര്\u200dട്ട് 79.39 ന്റെ ബിലിയുവിന്റെ സ്കോര്\u200dട്ട് എത്തുന്നു. അത രണ്ടുപേരും മത്സരിക്കുന്ന രണ്ട് മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് തുല്യമാണ്.', 'sv': 'Talat språk skiljer sig från det skrivna språket i sin stil och struktur. Diskussioner som förekommer i transkriptioner från taligenkänningssystem hämmar i allmänhet utförandet av nedströms NLP-uppgifter. Därför är ett system för korrigering av språklöshet som omvandlar språklöshet till flytande text av stort värde. Denna uppsats introducerar en modell för diskretionskorrigering som översätter flytande text genom att dra inspiration från senaste encoder-avkodare oövervakade stilöverföringsmodeller för text. Vi visar också betydande prestationsförmåner när vi använder ett litet urval av 500 parallella flytande meningar på ett halvövervakat sätt. Vårt oövervakade tillvägagångssätt uppnår en BLEU-poäng på 79,39 på Switchboard corpus testset, med ytterligare förbättring till en BLEU-poäng på 85,28 med semi-övervakning. Båda är jämförbara med två konkurrensutsatta fullt övervakade modeller.', 'ta': 'பேசும் மொழி அதன் பாணி மற்றும் உருவமைப்பில் எழுதப்பட்ட மொழியிலிருந்து வேறுபட்டுள்ளது. பேச்சு அறிவிப்பு அமைப்புகளில் இருந்து எழுத்துக்களில் தெரியும் விளைவுகள் பொதுவாக NLP பணிகளின் செயல்பாட்டை கு அதனால், தெளிவான உரைக்கு தேர்வு செய்யும் திருத்தம் அமைப்பு மிகப் பெரிய மதிப்பு. இந்த தாள் தேர்வு திருத்தம் மாதிரியை குறிப்பிடுகிறது, அது தேவையான உரைக்கு மாற்றுகிறது. சமீபத்தில் குறியீட்டாளர் பாணி மாற்றும் மாதிர நாம் செயல்பாட்டில் மிகவும் உபயோகிக்கும் சிறிய மாதிரிகளைக் காட்டுகிறோம் 500 இணைப்பு துண்டிப்பு வாக்குகளை பாதிப்ப எங்கள் பாதுகாப்பாற்றப்படாத நிலையில் நிறுவப்போர்டு குறிப்பு சோதனை அமைப்பில் 79.39 பிலியு புள்ளி புள்ளி மதிப்பு அடையும், பிலியு புள்ளி  இரண்டும் இரண்டு போராடும் முழு கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளுக்கும் ஒப்பிடும்.', 'sr': 'Govoreni jezik je drugaèiji od pisanog jezika u stilu i strukturi. Nedostatak koji se pojavljuje u transkripcijama iz sustava prepoznavanja govora obično ometaju učinkovitost zadataka NLP-a. Zato je sistem korištenja nestabilnosti koji pretvara nestabilnost u tekući tekst velike vrijednosti. Ovaj papir predstavlja model korištenja nestabilnosti koji prevodi nestabilnost na tekući tekst crtanjem inspiracije iz nedavnih model a prebacivanja stila kodera-dekodera za tekst. Također pokazujemo značajne koristi u provedbi kada koristimo mali uzorak od 500 paralelnih rečenica koji ne padaju tečnost na pola nadzornog naèin a. Naš nepotrebni pristup postiže rezultat BLEU od 79,39 na setu testova korpusa Švicarskog broda, s daljnjim poboljšanjem do rezultata BLEU od 85,28 sa polu-nadzorom. Obojica su usporedni sa dva konkurentnog potpuno nadziranog modela.', 'si': 'ස්පූක් භාෂාවට ලියපු භාෂාවට වෙනස් වෙන්නේ එයාගේ ස්ථානය හා සංවිධානයෙන්. වාර්තාව පද්ධතියෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් පෙනුම් වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහට NLP වැඩේ  ඉතින්, විශාල විශාල පද්ධතියක් විශාල පාළුවට වෙනස් කරන්න පුළුවන් විශාල විශාල විශාල විශ Name අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන් අපේ නැවතිරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ස්විච්බෝර්ඩ් කොර්පුස් පරීක්ෂණයේ 79.39 කිරීමක් ලැබෙනවා, බ්ලෝයුස් පරීක්ෂණයක් 85.28 කිරීමක් ව දෙන්නම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් පරික්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්න පුළුවන්.', 'so': "Luqada lagu hadlo waa kala duwan yihiin luuqada qoraalka oo ku qoran qaabka iyo dhismihiisa. Shaqoyinka ka muuqata qoraalka nidaamka aqoonsiga hadalka waxaa inta badan dhibaataysa sameynta shaqada NLP hoose. Thus, a disfluency correction system that converts disfluent to fluent text is of great value.  Kanu wuxuu soo bandhigaa model hagitaan, kaas oo ku taraysa mid aan faa'iido u lahayn text fluent, kaas oo soo tegaya muusiko ka soo baxa qoraal-coder-decoder-unservised style-transfer-text. Sidoo kale waxaan sidoo kale muujinnaa manfacyo aad u badan oo sameeya marka lagu isticmaalo tusaale yar oo 500 oo lambaro ah oo lagu kala duwan karo xafiiska. Dhaqdhaqaalahayaga aan la ilaalinayn wuxuu gaadhaa koox BLEU oo ah 79.39 oo ku qoran imtixaanka baaritaanka qoyska ee Switchboard, waxaana lagu hagaajiyaa kooxda BLEU oo ah 85.28 oo lagu ilaaliyo semi. Labaduba waa u eg labada tusaale oo si adag u ilaaliya.", 'ur': 'زبان لکھی زبان سے اس کی طرح اور ساختار میں مختلف ہے۔ جو بات کی شناسایی سیسٹموں سے ترنسکریپٹوں میں ظاہر ہوتے ہیں، ان کی نازل NLP کے کاموں کی عمدگی کو دھوکا دیتی ہے. اسی طرح، ایک غلطی سیسٹم جو غلطی کو پلانٹ ٹیکسٹ میں تبدیل کرتا ہے بڑی ارزش ہے۔ This paper introduces a disfluency correction model that translates disfluent to fluent text by drawing inspiration from recent encoder-decoder unsupervised style-transfer models for text. ہم نے بھی عملکرد میں بہت اچھے فائدہ دکھائے ہیں جب 500 مشابہ غیر غیر غیر فائدہ کے مطابق ایک چھوٹا نمونہ استعمال کریں۔ ہمارے غیر قابل تحقیق کے مطابق سوئیچبورڈ کورپوس تست سٹ پر 79.39 BLEU score پہنچ جاتا ہے، اور نیم نظر کے مطابق BLEU score 85.28 کے مطابق اضافہ کرتا ہے. دونوں دوسرے مسابقات پر مطابق نظر رکھے ہوئے موڈل کے مطابق مطابق ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Name Shunday qilib, oqsil matnni oʻzgartirib boʻlmaydigan tizim juda qiymat. Name Biz bajarish uchun juda ko'p foydalanuvchilar ko'rsamiz. 500 parametrlar o'zgaruvchining kichkina misollaridan foydalanayotganda. Bizning saqlanmagan tilimiz Shvechboarda kompyuterning sinov sohasida 79.39ning BLEU scorini bajaradi, va qayta taʼminlovchi bo'lgan BLEU scorini 85.28 darajaga oshirish mumkin. Икковлари мувофиқ қонун кўринган модейликка баробар.", 'vi': 'Ngôn ngữ nói khác với ngôn ngữ văn bản theo phong cách và cấu trúc của nó. Các biến số xuất hiện trong các ghi chép từ hệ thống nhận dạng giọng nói thường cản trở việc thực hiện các công việc xuôi dòng. Do đó, một hệ thống sửa chữa thói quen biến đổi không lưu thành văn bản trôi chảy là rất có giá trị. Tờ giấy này giới thiệu một mô hình sửa chữa sai lưu động dịch chuyển thành thạo văn bản bằng cách lấy nguồn cảm hứng từ những mẫu mã hóa mới nhất, không được giám sát, truyền văn bản. Chúng tôi cũng cho thấy những lợi ích đáng kể trong việc sử dụng một mẫu nhỏ của 500 song song chứng không thạo thành thạo các câu theo cách gần giám sát. Cách tiếp cận không giám sát của chúng ta đạt được một lượng đứng của tiếng bíp trong nhóm thí nghiệm cơ thể Switchard.39, với mức độ nâng cao hơn so với số lượng đứng của 85.8 với nửa giám sát. Cả hai đều tương đương với hai mẫu được giám sát cạnh tranh.', 'bg': 'Говореният език е различен от писмения език по своя стил и структура. Разстройствата, които се появяват в транскрипциите от системите за разпознаване на речта, обикновено затрудняват изпълнението на задачите по НЛП надолу по веригата. По този начин, система за корекция на дисфлуънтността, която преобразува дисфлуънт в плавен текст, е от голяма стойност. Настоящата статия представя модел за корекция на дисфлуънтността, който превежда дисфлуънт в плавен текст чрез извличане на вдъхновение от скорошни кодер-декодер модели за пренос на стил за текст без надзор. Ние също така показваме значителни ползи в ефективността, когато използваме малка извадка от 500 паралелни дисfluents-fluents изречения по полу-надзорен начин. Нашият ненадзорен подход постига оценка от 79,39 в комплекта тестове на корпуса на комутаторното табло, с допълнително подобрение до оценка от 85,28 при полунадзор. И двете са сравними с два конкурентни модела, напълно контролирани.', 'nl': 'Gesproken taal verschilt van de geschreven taal in zijn stijl en structuur. Afwijkingen die voorkomen in transcripties van spraakherkenningssystemen belemmeren over het algemeen de uitvoering van downstream NLP-taken. Zo is een disfluent correctiesysteem dat disfluent omzet in vloeiende tekst van grote waarde. Dit artikel introduceert een disfluency correctie model dat disfluency vertaalt naar vloeiende tekst door inspiratie te halen uit recente encoder-decoder onbeheerde stijl-transfer modellen voor tekst. We tonen ook aanzienlijke voordelen in prestaties bij het gebruik van een kleine steekproef van 500 parallelle disfluent-vloeiende zinnen op een semi-begeleide manier. Onze onbeheerde aanpak bereikt een BLEU score van 79.39 op de Switchboard corpus test set, met verdere verbetering naar een BLEU score van 85.28 met semi-supervisie. Beide zijn vergelijkbaar met twee concurrerende modellen met volledig toezicht.', 'da': 'Talt sprog er forskelligt fra det skrevne sprog i sin stil og struktur. Diskussioner, der vises i transskriptioner fra talegenkendelsessystemer, hæmmer generelt udførelsen af downstream NLP-opgaver. Således er et system til korrektion af diskløshed, der konverterer diskløshed til flydende tekst, af stor værdi. Dette papir introducerer en diskflydende korrektionsmodel, der oversætter diskflydende til flydende tekst ved at trække inspiration fra nyere encoder-dekoder upervagte stiloverførselsmodeller til tekst. Vi viser også betydelige fordele i ydeevnen, når vi bruger en lille prøve på 500 parallelle flydende sætninger på en semi-overvåget måde. Vores uautoriserede tilgang opnår en BLEU score på 79,39 på Switchboard corpus testsættet, med yderligere forbedring til en BLEU score på 85,28 med semi-supervision. Begge kan sammenlignes med to konkurrencedygtige fuldt overvågede modeller.', 'de': 'Die gesprochene Sprache unterscheidet sich in ihrem Stil und ihrer Struktur von der geschriebenen Sprache. Störungen, die in Transkriptionen von Spracherkennungssystemen auftreten, erschweren in der Regel die Durchführung nachgeschalteter NLP-Aufgaben. Daher ist ein Fehlerkorrektursystem von großem Wert, das nicht fließenden Text in fließenden Text umwandelt. Diese Arbeit stellt ein Diskluenzkorrekturmodell vor, das diffluenten in fließenden Text übersetzt, indem sie sich von aktuellen Encoder-Decoder-Modellen für den unveraufsichtigten Stiltransfer für Text inspirieren lässt. Wir zeigen auch erhebliche Leistungsvorteile, wenn wir eine kleine Stichprobe von 500 parallelen disfluent-fluent-fluent Sätzen halbüberwacht verwenden. Unser unbeaufsichtigter Ansatz erreicht einen BLEU-Score von 79,39 am Switchboard-Korpus-Testset, mit einer weiteren Verbesserung auf einen BLEU-Score von 85,28 mit Halbüberwachung. Beide sind vergleichbar mit zwei wettbewerbsfähigen voll überwachten Modellen.', 'id': 'Spoken language is different from the written language in its style and structure.  Disfluencies yang muncul dalam transkripsi dari sistem pengenal pidato umumnya menghalangi prestasi tugas NLP turun. Thus, a disfluency correction system that converts disfluent to fluent text is of great value.  Kertas ini memperkenalkan model koreksi cacat yang menerjemahkan cacat ke teks cacat dengan menggambar inspirasi dari model pengkode-dekoder baru-baru ini tidak diawasi gaya-transfer model untuk teks. Kami juga menunjukkan keuntungan yang besar dalam prestasi ketika menggunakan sampel kecil dari 500 kalimat paralel disfluent-fluent dalam cara semi-mengawasi. pendekatan kita tidak diawasi mencapai nilai BLEU 79,39 pada set tes corpus Switchboard, dengan peningkatan lanjut ke nilai BLEU 85,28 dengan semi-pengawasan. Keduanya bisa dibandingkan dengan dua model kompetitif yang diawasi sepenuhnya.', 'ko': '구어는 문체와 구조상 서면어와 다르다.음성 인식 시스템에 나타나는 기록이 원활하지 않으면 보통 하위 NLP 작업의 집행을 방해할 수 있다.따라서 유창하지 않은 텍스트를 유창한 텍스트로 바꾸는 유창하지 않은 교정 시스템은 중요한 가치를 가진다.본고는 유창하지 않은 교정 모델을 소개했다. 이 모델은 최근의 인코딩-디코더 무감독 텍스트 스타일 전환 모델을 참고하여 유창하지 않은 텍스트를 유창한 텍스트로 전환했다.우리가 반감독의 방식으로 500개의 평행 유창하지 않은 문장의 견본을 사용할 때, 우리도 상당히 큰 성능 우위를 나타냈다.우리의 무감독 방법은 본체 어료고 시험집에서 BLEU 점수 79.39점을 받았고, 반감독 상황에서 BLEU 점수는 85.28점으로 더 높아졌다.이 두 모델 모두 두 개의 완전 감독의 경쟁 모델과 비교할 수 있다.', 'hr': 'Govoreni jezik je drugačiji od pisaćeg jezika u stilu i strukturi. Nedostajenja koje se pojavljuju u prepisama iz sustava prepoznavanja govora obično ometaju učinkovitost zadataka NLP-a. Dakle, sistem korištenja nestabilnosti koji pretvara nestabilnost u tekući tekst ima veliku vrijednost. Ovaj papir predstavlja model korekcije nestabilnosti koji prevodi nestabilnost tekućem tekstu crtanjem inspiracije iz nedavnih model a prebacivanja stila kodera-dekodera za tekst. Također pokazujemo značajne koristi u učinkovitosti kada koristimo mali uzorak od 500 paralelnih presudi za nestajanje tekućine na polu nadzirani način. Naš nepotrebni pristup postiže rezultat BLEU-a 79,39 na setu testa korpusa Švicarskog odbora, s daljnjim poboljšanjem do rezultata BLEU-a od 85,28 s polovičnim nadzorom. Oboje su uspoređene s dva konkurentnog potpuno nadziranog modela.', 'sw': 'Lugha ya hotuba ni tofauti na lugha iliyoandikwa katika mtindo na muundo wake. Matukio yanayoonekana kwenye maandishi ya mfumo wa kutambua hotuba kwa ujumla yanahamasisha kazi za NLP za chini. Kwa hiyo, mfumo wa uharibifu ambao unabadilisha kutokuwepo kwa usawa wa maandishi yalikuwa na thamani kubwa. Gazeti hili linaonyesha modeli ya uharibifu ambao hutafsiri kutokuwa na ufahamu wa kuandika ujumbe wa mafanikio kwa kuchora hamasa kutoka kwa mfumo wa usafirishaji wa taarifa za hivi karibuni usioangaliwa. We also show considerable benefits in performance when utilizing a small sample of 500 parallel disfluent-fluent sentences in a semi-supervised way.  Hatua yetu yasiyokuwa na uhakika inafanikiwa vipimo vya BLEU 79.39 kwenye seti ya jaribio la baraza la Switzerland, na kuboreshwa zaidi kwa vipimo vya BLEU 85.28 yenye sura ya nusu. Wote wawili ni sawa na mifano miwili yenye ushindani mkubwa.', 'sq': 'Gjuha e folur është ndryshe nga gjuha e shkruar në stilin dhe strukturën e saj. Mungesat që shfaqen në transkriptime nga sistemet e njohjes së fjalës përgjithësisht pengojnë kryerjen e detyrave të NLP-së në vazhdim. Thus, a disfluency correction system that converts disfluent to fluent text is of great value.  Ky artikull paraqet një model korrigjimi të diskutimit që përkthen diskutim në tekst të diskutimit duke vizatuar frymëzim nga modelet e fundit të kodifikuesit-dekoderit për transferim stili pa mbikqyrje për tekst. Ne tregojmë gjithashtu përfitime të konsiderueshme në performancë kur përdorim një mostër të vogël prej 500 dënimesh paralele të rrjedhura në një mënyrë gjysmë-mbikqyrure. Përqasja jonë e pazgjidhur arrin një pikë BLEU prej 79.39 në grupin e testit të korpusit Switchboard, me përmirësim të mëtejshëm në një pikë BLEU prej 85.28 me gjysmë-mbikqyrje. Të dy janë të krahasueshme me dy modele konkurruese të mbikqyrur plotësisht.', 'fa': 'زبان حرف زدن از زبان نوشته در شکل و ساختارش متفاوت است. تغییرات که در ترجمه\u200cها از سیستم شناسایی سخنرانی ظاهر می\u200cشوند، عموماً عملکرد کارهای NLP پایین را متوقف می\u200cکند. بنابراین، یک سیستم اصلاح ناپذیری که ناپذیری را به متن روان تبدیل می کند، با ارزش بزرگی است. این کاغذ یک مدل اصلاح ناپذیری را معرفی می\u200cکند که با کشیدن الهام از مدل انتقال شیوه\u200cهای ناپذیر برای متن به متن ناپذیر تغییر می\u200cکند. ما همچنین سودهایی بسیار زیادی را در عملکرد نشان می دهیم وقتی با استفاده از نمونه کوچک از ۵۰۰ جمله\u200cهای متفاوتی که در یک طریق نیمه تحت نظر قرار گرفته\u200cاند. دستور غیرقابل تحقیق ما یک امتحان BLEU از 79.39 در مجموعه آزمایش کورپوس سوئیچ می رسد، با توجه بیشتری به امتحان BLEU از 85.28 با نیمه تحقیق می رسد. هر دو قابل مقایسه با دو مدل مسابقه کامل تحت نظر قرار دارند.', 'tr': 'Sözgür dili öz tarzda we strukturunda ýazylan dilden beýleki. Çaltylyk tanamak sistemalaryndan ýazylan wajyplar adatça NLP işlerinin etkinleşigini çarpýar. Böylece, nefesli olmayan bir düzeltme sistemi aklanma metine çevirir. Bu şekilde büyük değerlidir. Bu kagyz ýeterlik taýýarlama nusgasyny görkezýär. Bu hat ýakyn ködleme-taýýarlama modinden hat-taýýarlama nusgasyny üçin terjime edendir. Biz hem 500 paralel çekici cümleleri yarı gözetlenmiş şekilde küçük örnek kullanarak etkinlik etkinliğinde önemli faydalar gösteriyoruz. Biziň tassyklanmadyk ýagdaýymyz 79,39-njy BLEU ködleşigini Şweýsariýa korpus testi düzeninde, ýarym üstünde BLEU scoresyna 85,28-njy gowurak bilen gelişýär. Iki hem ýaryşykly doly gözleýän nusgalar bilen ýaly.', 'am': 'ቋንቋ በተጻፈው ቋንቋ በዓይነቱ እና በመሠረቱ የተለየ ነው። በንግግር ማስታወቂያው ስርዓቶች ላይ የሚታይ ክፍተት የNLP ስራዎችን በጠቅላላ ያሳድዳል፡፡ ስለዚህም የውጤት ማቀናጃ ስርዓት በጽሑፍ ለመቀላቀል ዋጋ ነው፡፡ ይህ ፕሮግራም የፊደል ቅርጽ ማቀናጃ ሞዴል ነው፡፡ እንደዚህም በ500 ተሳታፊ የውሃት ውጤቶች በተጠቀም ጊዜ የሚያሳየው ጥቅሞችን እናሳየዋለን፡፡ ያልጠበቀው ሥርዓታችን የስዊትቦር ኮርፓስ ፈተና ላይ 79.39 የBLEU score አግኝቷል፡፡ ሁለቱም ለሁለቱ ተቃዋሚዎች በሙሉ ተሟጋቾች መስኮቶች ናቸው፡፡', 'af': "Spoken taal is anders van die skriftelike taal in sy styl en struktuur. Verskeidings wat verskyn in transkripsies van spraak herkening stelsels generellik hamper die prestasie van onderstreem NLP taak. Daarom, 'n afvloeiende korreksie stelsel wat onvloeiende na fluent teks omskakel is van groot waarde. Hierdie papier introduseer 'n onfluidigheidskorreksie model wat vertaling onfluidigheid na fluidigheid teks deur te teken inspirasie van onlangse enkoder- dekoder onderwerp styl- oordragmodele vir teks. Ons wys ook betekende voordele in uitvoerding wanneer 'n klein voorbeeld van 500 parallele afvloei-fluent setinge gebruik word op 'n semi-ondersoekte manier. Ons onverondersteunde toegang verkry 'n BLES aantal van 79,39 op die Switchboard corpus toets stel, met verdere verbetering tot 'n BLEU aantal van 85,28 met semi-supervisie. Beide is vergelykbaar met twee mededingste volledige ondersoekte modele.", 'hy': "Խոսվող լեզուն տարբերվում է գրված լեզուց իր ոճով և կառուցվածքով: Խոսքի ճանաչության համակարգերից թարգմանվող թերությունները ընդհանուր առմամբ խոչընդոտում են ՆԼՊ-ի հետագա խնդիրների կատարումը: Այսպիսով, անհեղության ուղղության համակարգը, որը վերածում է անհեղությունը հեղուկ տեքստի, շատ արժեքավոր է: Այս թղթին ներկայացնում է անհեղության ուղղության մոդել, որը թարգմանում է անհեղությունը հեղուկ տեքստի վրա՝ ոգեշնչելով վերջերս կոդեր-կոդեր անվերահսկված ոճի փոխանցման մոդելներից տեքստի համար: Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս նշանակալի առավելություններ արտադրողության մեջ, երբ կիսակառավարվող կերպով օգտագործում ենք 500 զուգահեռ հեռացող նախադասությունների փոքրիկ նմուշը: Մեր անվերահսկված մոտեցումը հասնում է 79.39 բԼԵՎ գնահատականի Սվիթբուրթ կորպոս թեստերի համակարգում, որն ավելի լավ է հասնում 85.28 բԼԵՎ գնահատականին' կիսավերահսկողությամբ: Both are comparable to two competitive fully-supervised models.", 'bn': 'ভাষা তার স্টাইল এবং কাঠামো থেকে লিখিত ভাষার ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন। ভাষণ স্বীকৃতি সিস্টেম থেকে প্রকাশিত বিপর্যয়ের ক্ষেত্রে যা সাধারণত এনএলপি কাজের প্রদর্শনের ক্ষেত্রে বিপর্যয় কাজেই একটি সংশোধনী সিস্টেম, যা ফ্লায়েন্ট টেক্সটের প্রতি অস্বাভাবিক পাল্টে যায়, তা বিশাল মান। এই পত্রিকাটি একটি সংশোধনীয় মডেল পরিচয় করিয়ে দেয় যা সাম্প্রতিক কোডার-ডেকোডারের জন্য সংরক্ষিত স্টাইল-transfer মডেলের জন্য অনুপ্রাণিত করে ফ্লায়েন্ট আমরা অনুষ্ঠানে প্রদর্শন করি যখন ৫০০ সামান্য প্যারালেল ফ্লুয়েন্টের ব্যবহার করে দেখা যায়, সেমি পর্যবেক্ষণকারীদের মধ্যে দিয়ে। আমাদের অরক্ষিত পদ্ধতি সুইটচবোর্ড কোর্পাস সেটে ৭৯. দুটো প্রতিযোগিতার সাথে পুরোপুরি পর্যবেক্ষিত মডেলের সাথে তুলনা।', 'ca': "La llengua parlada és diferent de la llengua escrita en el seu estil i estructura. Les distàncies que apareixen en transcripcions dels sistemes de reconeixement de la fala dificulten generalment el desempeny de tasques avançades de la NLP. Així, un sistema de correcció de la disfluència que converteix el disfluent en text fluent és de gran valor. This paper introduces a disfluency correction model that translates disfluent to fluent text by drawing inspiration from recent encoder-decoder unsupervised style-transfer models for text.  També demostram beneficis consideràveis en el rendiment quan utilitzem una petita mostra de 500 frases paralleles de fluent de forma semisupervisada. El nostre enfocament no supervisat aconsegueix una puntuació BLEU de 79,39 en el conjunt d'exàmens de Switchboard corpus, amb una millora ulterior a una puntuació BLEU de 85,28 amb semisupervisió. Ambdós són comparables a dos models competitius plenament supervisats.", 'bs': 'Govoreni jezik je drugačiji od pisanog jezika u stilu i strukturi. Nedostajenja koje se pojavljuju u transkripcijama iz sustava prepoznavanja govora općenito ometaju učinkovitost spuštanja zadataka NLP-a. Zato je sistem korištenja nestabilnosti koji pretvara nestabilnost u tekući tekst velike vrijednosti. Ovaj papir predstavlja model korištenja nestabilnosti koji prevodi nestabilnost na tekući tekst crtanjem inspiracije iz nedavnih model a prebacivanja stila kodera-dekodera za tekst. Također pokazujemo značajne koristi u učinkovitosti kada koristimo mali uzorak od 500 paralelnih presudi za nestajanje tečnosti na polu-nadzorni način. Naš nepotrebni pristup postiže rezultat BLEU od 79,39 na setu test a korpusa Švicarskog broda, s daljnjim poboljšanjem do rezultata BLEU-a od 85,28 s polu-nadzorom. Obojica su usporedni sa dva konkurentna potpuno nadzirana modela.', 'et': 'Kõnelev keel erineb kirjakeelest oma stiililt ja struktuurilt. Kõnetuvastussüsteemide transkriptsioonides ilmnevad häired takistavad üldiselt uue õppekava ülesannete täitmist. Seega on disfluentsuse korrigeerimise süsteem, mis muundab disfluentsi sujuvaks tekstiks, väga väärtuslik. Käesolevas töös tutvustatakse disfluentsuse korrigeerimise mudelit, mis tõlgib disfluentsi sujuvaks tekstiks inspiratsiooni hiljutistest tekstikodeerijate-dekooderite järelevalveta stiiliülekande mudelitest. Samuti näitame märkimisväärset kasu jõudluses, kui kasutame väikest valimit 500 paralleelset disfluentsi-vabalt lauset pooljuhitaval viisil. Meie järelevalveta lähenemine saavutab BLEU skoori 79,39 Switchboard korpuse testikomplektis ning täiendab BLEU skoori 85,28 pooljärelevalvega. Mõlemad on võrreldavad kahe konkurentsivõimelise täieliku järelevalve all oleva mudeliga.', 'az': 'Söylənən dil yazılmış dilindən başqadır. Sözlük tanıma sistemlərindəki transkriptlərdə görünən fərqli fərqli NLP işlərinin performansını dəyişdirir. Beləliklə, dəyişiklik mətnə döndərən dəyişiklik düzəltmə sistemi böyük qiymətlidir. Bu kağıt, yeni kodlayıcı-dekoderdən ilham çəkib müəyyən edilməmiş stil-transferi modellərini məktub üçün dəyişiklik məlumatına dəyişiklik etmək üçün fərqli məlumatı dəyişdirir. Biz həmçin in 500 paralel fərqli fərqli cümlələri yarı-gözləyir kimi istifadə edən kiçik nümunə göstəririk. Bizim müəyyən edilməmiş tərzimiz İsviçbord korpusu sınamasında 79,39 BLEU nöqtəsinə nail ola bilər. İkisi də iki müharibə tamamlanmış modellərlə bərabər.', 'cs': 'Mluvený jazyk se liší od psaného jazyka svým stylem a strukturou. Nerovnosti, které se objevují v přepisech ze systémů rozpoznávání řeči, obecně brání výkon následných úkolů NLP. Proto má velkou hodnotu systém korekce neplazenosti, který převádí neplazenost na plynulý text. Tento článek představuje model korekce nesplynulosti, který překládá nesplynulý na plynulý text inspirací z nedávných modelů přenosu stylu pro text bez dohledu. Také ukazujeme značné výhody v oblasti výkonu při použití malého vzorku 500 paralelních nesplynulých vět v polovičním dohledu. Náš bez dozoru přístup dosahuje BLEU skóre 79,39 na testovací sadě korpusu Switchboardu, s dalším zlepšením na BLEU skóre 85,28 s polovičním dohledem. Oba jsou srovnatelné se dvěma konkurenčními modely plně dohledu.', 'fi': 'Puhuttu kieli eroaa kirjoitetusta kielestﾃ､ tyyliltﾃ､ﾃ､n ja rakenteeltaan. Puheentunnistusjﾃ､rjestelmien transkriptioissa esiintyvﾃ､t hﾃ､iriﾃｶt haittaavat yleensﾃ､ NLP-tehtﾃ､vien suorittamista. Disfluenssin korjausjﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､, joka muuntaa disfluenssin sujuvaksi tekstiksi, on siis erittﾃ､in arvokas. Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ artikkelissa esitellﾃ､ﾃ､n disfluenssin korjausmalli, joka kﾃ､ﾃ､ntﾃ､ﾃ､ disfluenssin sujuvaksi tekstiksi inspiraation uusimmista kooderi-dekooderin hallitsemattomista tekstinsiirtomalleista. Osoitamme myﾃｶs merkittﾃ､viﾃ､ hyﾃｶtyjﾃ､ suorituskyvyssﾃ､ kﾃ､ytettﾃ､essﾃ､ pientﾃ､ 500 rinnakkaisen disfluentti-sujuvan lauseen otosta puolivalvotulla tavalla. Valvontattomalla lﾃ､hestymistavalla saavutamme BLEU-pisteen 79,39 Switchboard-korpustestisarjassa ja parannamme edelleen BLEU-pisteeksi 85,28 puolivalvonnan avulla. Molemmat ovat verrattavissa kahteen kilpailtuun tﾃ､ysin valvottuun malliin.', 'jv': 'Pikno luwih mengko sakjane kanggo kelas nang sampek lan sakjane. Tolah Dijejer-jejer, sistem sing dibuturan kanggo ngawehi dianggo teks sing wis luar. Bu peutel ngewehke sistem karo nesaturan itolaksen model sing dumateng, multiverse dumateng teka itolaksen teks Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem akeh barang-barang nggawe diuntingi kapan kuwi ampuhé gambar aparaning 500 soko cah-cah dumadhil liyane wis dipatengan Awak dhéwé ora nggawe perusahaan kanggo dianggapkno sing nggawe tarjamahan kanggo sekondirno blek, nari kalah-sekondirno pancening nggo kalah-sekondirno ; Duganggu sampeyan karo model sing sampeyan sampeyan iki', 'sk': 'Govorjeni jezik se po svojem slogu in strukturi razlikuje od pisanega jezika. Motnje, ki se pojavijo v transkripcijah iz sistemov za prepoznavanje govora, običajno ovirajo izvajanje nalog nadaljnjega NLP. Tako je sistem popravljanja disfluentnosti, ki pretvori disfluentno v tekoče besedilo, veliko vrednost. V prispevku je predstavljen model popravljanja disfluentnosti, ki prevaja disfluentno v tekoče besedilo s črpanjem navdiha iz nedavnih modelov za prenos slogov za besedilo brez nadzora. Prav tako kažemo precejšnje koristi pri zmogljivosti pri uporabi majhnega vzorca 500 vzporednih disfluentnih stavkov na pol nadzorovan način. Naš nenadzorovan pristop doseže rezultat BLEU 79,39 na kompletu testiranja korpusa Switchboard, z nadaljnjim izboljšanjem na rezultat BLEU 85,28 s polnadzorom. Oba sta primerljiva z dvema konkurenčnima popolnoma nadzorovanima modeloma.', 'he': 'שפה מדברת שונה מהשפה הכתובה בסגנון והמבנה שלה. מחלות שמופיעות בתסריטים ממערכות זיהוי הנאום בדרך כלל מפריעות לבצע משימות NLP מתקדמות. לכן, מערכת תיקון חסר השפעה שמהפכת חסר השפעה לטקסט שופע היא בעלת ערך גדול. הנייר הזה מציג דוגמא תיקון חסר השפעה שמתרגמת חסר השפעה לטקסט חוסר השפעה על ידי ציירת השראה ממדוגמאות העברת סגנון לא מעוקבות לאחרונה לטקסט. אנו גם מראים יתרונות משמעותיות בהופעה כשמשתמשים בדגימה קטנה של 500 משפטים ממזוריים שזורקים בדרך חצי-מפקחת. הגישה שלנו ללא השגחה משיגה נקודת BLEU של 79.39 על קבוצת הבדיקות הקורפוס Switchboard, עם שיפור נוסף לציון BLEU של 85.28 עם חצי-פיקוח. שניהם שווים לשני דוגמנים תחרותיים ששולטים במלוא.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Farawa da ke cikin takardar da aka yi bayani daga tsarin sunarwa, yana ƙarar da aikin NLP. Kamar haka, wata na'urar gaske da za'a bada ta zama kima mai girma. Wannan takardan na ƙunsa da wata motel mai haƙƙi, mai fassara zuwa matsayin mai ruwan aiki da ya nuna hamoyi daga kwamfyutan kode-dioder wanda ba'a tsare wa salon-transfer wa matsayin. Tuna nũna masu amfani da mafarin aiki da ko da za'a yi amfani da wani misãlai ƙarami na 300 da sauri-diffused a semi-domin. Tsarakanmu da ba'a tsare ba ta sami wata BLEU na tsari na 79.39 a kan jarraba nau'in Shiftboard, sami kuma ya sami gabatar da kimar BLEU na 85.28. Dukansu sunã kami da misãlai biyu masu yin aiki da ƙarfi.", 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་བྲིས་ཡིག་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་དང་དབྱིབས་ནང་ལས་ཁྱད་པར་མི་འདུག གསལ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་མ་འོང་བའི་འགྱུར་བ་དེ་མངོན་འཕགས་པ་ཞིག་ལས་ཕལ་རིས་ཤེས་ཐབས་མེད། དེར་བརྟེན། འགྱུར་བ་འགྱུར་བ་ཀྱིས་འགྱུར་ཅན་གྱི་ཡིག་གེ་ལྡན་རིམ་ཐང་ཆེ་བའི་ཐོབ་གྲངས་རེད། This paper introduces a disfluency correction model that translates disfluent to fluent text by drawing inspiration from recent encoder-decoder unsupervised style-transfer models for text. ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚུལ་ལྡན་པའི་ཚོར་བ་ཞིག་དག་གི་སྔོན་ཕྲག་མཐོང་པ་ཞིག་གིས་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་སྐབས་ལྟ་བུའི་རྐྱེན་ཚོགས་ལྡ ང་ཚོའི་མིའི་གྲངས་སྐོར་མེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སྐོར་ཡོད་པས། རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་གཞུང་ཚང་གི་མཐོང་ཚད་ལྡན་79.39 རྣམ་པས། རྒྱལ་ཁབ་གཉིས་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཐའ་དབུགས་བསྡོམས་པའི་མིག་དཔེ་གཉིས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་བཟོས་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Complex Question Answering on knowledge graphs using machine translation and multi-task learning', 'pt': 'Resposta a perguntas complexas em gráficos de conhecimento usando tradução automática e aprendizado multitarefa', 'es': 'Respuestas complejas a preguntas sobre gráficos de conocimiento mediante traducción automática y aprendizaje multitarea', 'ar': 'إجابة أسئلة معقدة على الرسوم البيانية المعرفية باستخدام الترجمة الآلية والتعلم متعدد المهام', 'fr': "Réponses aux questions complexes sur des graphiques de connaissances grâce à la traduction automatique et à l'apprentissage multitâche", 'ja': '機械翻訳とマルチタスク学習を使用したナレッジグラフへの複雑な質問への回答', 'zh': '用机器翻译与多任务学图谱杂问', 'hi': 'जटिल प्रश्न मशीन अनुवाद और बहु-कार्य सीखने का उपयोग करके ज्ञान रेखांकन पर उत्तर देना', 'ru': 'Ответы на сложные вопросы на графиках знаний с использованием машинного перевода и многозадачного обучения', 'ga': 'Ceist Choimpléascach Freagairt ar ghraif eolais ag baint úsáide as meaisínaistriúchán agus foghlaim ilthasc', 'hu': 'Komplex kérdések Válasz a tudásdiagramokon gépi fordítás és többfeladatos tanulás segítségével', 'el': 'Απαντήσεις σύνθετων ερωτήσεων σε γραφήματα γνώσης χρησιμοποιώντας μηχανική μετάφραση και εκμάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών', 'ka': 'კომპლექტური კითხვების პასუხი მეცნიერების გრაფიკის გამოყენება მაქინის გაგრძელება და მრავალური დასწავლება', 'it': "Rispondere ai grafici delle conoscenze utilizzando la traduzione automatica e l'apprendimento multi-task", 'lt': 'Sudėtingas atsakymas į klausimus dėl žinių grafikų naudojant mašininį vertimą ir mokymąsi įvairiomis užduotimis', 'ms': 'Jawapan soalan kompleks pada graf pengetahuan menggunakan terjemahan mesin dan pembelajaran-tugas berbilang', 'ml': 'ജ്ഞാന ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് മെഷിന്\u200d പരിഭാഷവും പല- ജോലി പഠിക്കുന്നതും ഉപയോഗിച്ച് പരിജ്ഞാന വിവ', 'kk': 'Компьютерді аудару мен көп тапсырмаларды оқыту арқылы білім графиктерінің жауап беру', 'mk': 'Complex Question Answering on knowledge graphs using machine translation and multi-task learning', 'mn': 'Мэдлэг графикийн хариулт нь машин хөрөнгө оруулах болон олон ажлын сургалтыг ашиглан', 'mt': 'Tweġiba kumplessa għal mistoqsijiet dwar grafiċi tal-għarfien bl-użu tat-traduzzjoni tal-magni u t-tagħlim b’ħafna kompiti', 'pl': 'Odpowiedzi na złożone pytania na wykresach wiedzy za pomocą tłumaczenia maszynowego i uczenia się wielozadaniowego', 'no': 'Comment', 'ro': 'Răspunsul la întrebări complexe privind graficele cunoștințelor utilizând traducerea automată și învățarea multi-task', 'sr': 'Kompleksno pitanje Odgovor na grafike znanja koristeći prevod mašine i učenje više zadataka', 'si': 'මැෂින් වාර්ථාව සහ ගොඩක් වැඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරය ප්\u200dරශ්න', 'sv': 'Komplexa frågeställningar Svara på kunskapsgrafer med hjälp av maskinöversättning och multi-task learning', 'so': 'Complex Question Answering on knowledge graphs using machine translation and multi-task learning', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'ماشین ترجمہ اور بہت سی تاسپ کی تعلیم کے مطابق علم گرافسوں کے بارے میں جواب دینے کی مکمل سؤال', 'vi': 'Trả lời câu hỏi phức tạp về đồ thị về kiến thức sử dụng dịch máy và học nhiều nhiệm vụ', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Сложни въпроси Отговаряне на графики на знанието с помощта на машинен превод и многофункционално обучение', 'nl': 'Complexe Vragen beantwoorden op kennisgrafieken met behulp van machine translation en multi-task learning', 'da': 'Komplekse spørgsmål Besvarelse af vidensgrafer ved hjælp af maskinoversættelse og multi-task learning', 'ko': '기계 번역과 다중 임무 학습에 기초한 지식도 복잡한 문답', 'fa': 'پاسخ سوال پیچیده در گرافیک دانش با استفاده از ترجمه ماشین و یادگیری چندین کار', 'hr': 'Kompleksno pitanje Odgovor na znanja grafike koristeći prevod strojeva i učenje multizadataka', 'de': 'Beantwortung komplexer Fragen auf Wissensdiagrammen mit maschineller Übersetzung und Multi-Task Learning', 'id': 'Jawaban Pertanyaan Kompleks pada grafik pengetahuan menggunakan terjemahan mesin dan belajar multi-tugas', 'tr': 'Makina terjime we köp-täbli öwrenmek üçin bilim grafiklerinden jogap bermek üçin kompleks sorag', 'af': 'Kompleks Vrag Antwoord op kennis grafieke gebruik masjien vertaling en multi-taak leer', 'sq': 'Përgjigja e pyetjeve komplekse në grafikat e njohurive duke përdorur përkthimin e makinave dhe mësimin me shumë detyra', 'am': 'የመሳዊ ትርጉም እና በብዙ-ስራ ትምህርት በመጠቀም የእውቀት ቀለም ላይ ጥያቄ', 'hy': 'Գիտելու գրաֆիկների բարդ հարցերի պատասխանը մեքենայի թարգմանման և բազմախնդիրների ուսումնասիրության միջոցով', 'sw': 'Swali la kompleks linajibu kuhusu picha za maarifa kwa kutumia tafsiri ya mashine na kujifunza kwa kazi nyingi', 'bs': 'Kompleksno pitanje Odgovor na grafike znanja koristeći prevod mašine i učenje multizadataka', 'cs': 'Komplexní odpovědi na otázky na znalostních grafech pomocí strojového překladu a víceúlohového učení', 'az': 'Makinat √ßevirimi v…ô √ßoxlu iŇül…ôr √∂yr…ônm…ôyi istifad…ô ed…ôn elm grafikl…ôri bar…ôsind…ô kompleks sual cavab verm…ôk', 'bn': 'মেশিন অনুবাদ এবং বহুকাজ শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করে জ্ঞান গ্রাফ ব্যবহার করে কমপ্লেক্স প্রশ্নের উত্তর', 'et': 'Keeruline küsimustele vastamine teadmiste graafikutel masintõlke ja mitmeülesandeõppe abil', 'fi': 'Monimutkainen kysymysvastaus tietokaavioihin konekäännöksen ja monitehtävän oppimisen avulla', 'ca': 'Una resposta complexa a preguntes sobre gràfics de coneixement utilitzant traducció automàtica i aprenentatge multitascat', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'Komplit Gales Jabung barang kanggo ngerasar barang nggambar tarjamahan karo multi-task liang', 'he': 'תשובת שאלות מורכבת על גרפי ידע בשימוש בתרגום מכונות וללמד במשימות רבות', 'sk': 'Kompleksno odgovarjanje na vprašanja na grafikonih znanja s strojnim prevajanjem in večopravilnim učenjem', 'bo': 'ཆས་ལྗོད་དང་སྣ་མང་ལས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་སྤྱོད་པའི་མཐུན་རིམ་གྱི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་སྟངས་མཇུག་བསྡུས་དགོས་པ'}
{'en': 'Question answering (QA) over a knowledge graph (KG) is a task of answering a natural language (NL) query using the information stored in KG. In a real-world industrial setting, this involves addressing multiple challenges including entity linking, multi-hop reasoning over KG, etc. Traditional approaches handle these challenges in a modularized sequential manner where errors in one module lead to the accumulation of errors in downstream modules. Often these challenges are inter-related and the solutions to them can reinforce each other when handled simultaneously in an end-to-end learning setup. To this end, we propose a multi-task BERT based Neural Machine Translation (NMT) model to address these challenges. Through experimental analysis, we demonstrate the efficacy of our proposed approach on one publicly available and one proprietary dataset.', 'pt': 'A resposta a perguntas (QA) sobre um gráfico de conhecimento (KG) é uma tarefa de responder a uma consulta em linguagem natural (NL) usando as informações armazenadas em KG. Em um ambiente industrial do mundo real, isso envolve lidar com vários desafios, incluindo vinculação de entidades, raciocínio multi-hop sobre KG, etc. . Muitas vezes, esses desafios estão inter-relacionados e as soluções para eles podem se reforçar quando tratadas simultaneamente em uma configuração de aprendizado de ponta a ponta. Para este fim, propomos um modelo de tradução automática neural (NMT) baseado em BERT multitarefa para enfrentar esses desafios. Por meio de análise experimental, demonstramos a eficácia de nossa abordagem proposta em um conjunto de dados disponível publicamente e um proprietário.', 'ar': 'تعد الإجابة عن الأسئلة (QA) على الرسم البياني للمعرفة (KG) مهمة للإجابة على استعلام لغة طبيعية (NL) باستخدام المعلومات المخزنة في KG. في بيئة صناعية في العالم الحقيقي ، يتضمن ذلك معالجة تحديات متعددة بما في ذلك ربط الكيانات ، والاستدلال متعدد القفزات على KG ، وما إلى ذلك. تتعامل الأساليب التقليدية مع هذه التحديات بطريقة متسلسلة معيارية حيث تؤدي الأخطاء في وحدة واحدة إلى تراكم الأخطاء في وحدات المصب . غالبًا ما تكون هذه التحديات مترابطة ويمكن للحلول الخاصة بها أن تعزز بعضها البعض عند التعامل معها في وقت واحد في إعداد التعلم الشامل. تحقيقًا لهذه الغاية ، نقترح نموذجًا متعدد المهام قائمًا على BERT للترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) لمواجهة هذه التحديات. من خلال التحليل التجريبي ، نوضح فعالية نهجنا المقترح على مجموعة بيانات واحدة متاحة للجمهور وواحدة مملوكة ملكية.', 'fr': "La réponse à une question (AQ) sur un graphe de connaissances (KG) consiste à répondre à une requête en langage naturel (NL) à l'aide des informations stockées dans KG. Dans un environnement industriel réel, cela implique de relever de multiples défis, y compris la liaison d'entités, le raisonnement multi-sauts sur KG, etc. Les approches traditionnelles traitent ces défis d'une manière séquentielle modulaire où les erreurs dans un module entraînent l'accumulation d'erreurs dans les modules en aval. Ces défis sont souvent interdépendants et les solutions peuvent se renforcer mutuellement lorsqu'elles sont traitées simultanément dans une configuration d'apprentissage de bout en bout. À cette fin, nous proposons un modèle de traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) multi-tâches basé sur BERT pour relever ces défis. Au moyen d'analyses expérimentales, nous démontrons l'efficacité de l'approche que nous proposons sur un ensemble de données public et un ensemble de données propriétaire.", 'es': 'La respuesta a preguntas (QA) sobre un gráfico de conocimiento (KG) es una tarea de responder a una consulta de lenguaje natural (NL) utilizando la información almacenada en KG. En un entorno industrial real, esto implica abordar múltiples desafíos, como la vinculación de entidades, el razonamiento de múltiples saltos sobre KG, etc. Los enfoques tradicionales manejan estos desafíos de manera secuencial modularizada, donde los errores en un módulo conducen a la acumulación de errores en los módulos posteriores. A menudo, estos desafíos están interrelacionados y las soluciones para ellos pueden reforzarse entre sí cuando se manejan simultáneamente en una configuración de aprendizaje de principio a fin. Con este fin, proponemos un modelo de traducción automática neuronal (NMT) multitarea basado en BERT para abordar estos desafíos. A través del análisis experimental, demostramos la eficacia de nuestro enfoque propuesto en un conjunto de datos de dominio público y uno de propiedad exclusiva.', 'ja': 'ナレッジグラフ（ KG ）を介した質疑応答（ QA ）は、KGに格納されている情報を使用して自然言語（ NL ）クエリに答える作業である。現実の産業環境では、これには、エンティティリンク、KGに対するマルチホップ推論などを含む複数の課題に対処することが含まれます。従来のアプローチは、１つのモジュール内のエラーが下流モジュール内のエラーの蓄積につながる、モジュール化された逐次的な方法でこれらの課題に対処する。多くの場合、これらの課題は相互に関連しており、それらに対する解決策は、エンドツーエンドの学習設定で同時に扱われる場合に互いに強化することができる。このために、私たちはこれらの課題に対処するためのマルチタスクBERTベースのニューラル・マシン・トランスレーション（ NMT ）モデルを提案します。実験的分析を通じて、私たちは、公開されている1つのデータセットと1つのプロプライエタリデータセットで提案されたアプローチの有効性を実証します。', 'hi': 'एक ज्ञान ग्राफ (KG) पर प्रश्न उत्तर (QA) KG में संग्रहीत जानकारी का उपयोग करके एक प्राकृतिक भाषा (NL) क्वेरी का उत्तर देने का एक कार्य है। एक वास्तविक दुनिया की औद्योगिक सेटिंग में, इसमें इकाई को जोड़ने, केजी पर मल्टी-हॉप तर्क आदि सहित कई चुनौतियों को संबोधित करना शामिल है। पारंपरिक दृष्टिकोण इन चुनौतियों को मॉड्यूलरीकृत अनुक्रमिक तरीके से संभालते हैं जहां एक मॉड्यूल में त्रुटियां डाउनस्ट्रीम मॉड्यूल में त्रुटियों के संचय का कारण बनती हैं। अक्सर ये चुनौतियां परस्पर संबंधित होती हैं और उनके समाधान एक दूसरे को मजबूत कर सकते हैं जब एक एंड-टू-एंड लर्निंग सेटअप में एक साथ संभाला जाता है। इस अंत के लिए, हम इन चुनौतियों को संबोधित करने के लिए एक बहु-कार्य BERT आधारित न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद (NMT) मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक विश्लेषण के माध्यम से, हम एक सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध और एक मालिकाना डेटासेट पर हमारे प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण की प्रभावकारिता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'zh': '知图谱 (KG) 之问 (QA) 用储 KG 之问自然语言 (NL) 问也。 世界工夫,多所挑战,及其链接,KG多踊跃推理。 古法以模块化次治之,其一模块之误,则下流模块之误积。 凡此挑战,所以相关也,当于端到端学设中而处之,其解决方案可以相强也。 为此立BERT之多任务神经机器翻译(NMT)以应之。 以实验论之,吾证吾所言,明可与专数集上之有效性。', 'ru': 'Ответы на вопросы (QA) по графу знаний (KG) - это задача ответа на запрос естественного языка (NL) с использованием информации, хранящейся в KG. В реальной промышленной среде это включает в себя решение множества проблем, в том числе связывание сущностей, мультихоп рассуждения о КГ и т. д. Традиционные подходы решают эти проблемы модульным последовательным образом, когда ошибки в одном модуле приводят к накоплению ошибок в последующих модулях. Зачастую эти проблемы взаимосвязаны, и решения для их решения могут усиливать друг друга при одновременном решении в комплексном обучении. С этой целью мы предлагаем многозадачную модель нейронного машинного перевода (НМП) на основе BERT для решения этих задач. С помощью экспериментального анализа мы демонстрируем эффективность нашего предлагаемого подхода на одном общедоступном и одном запатентованном наборе данных.', 'ga': 'Is éard atá i gceist le freagra ceisteanna (QA) thar ghraf eolais (KG) ná tasc a bhaineann le ceist theanga nádúrtha (NL) a fhreagairt ag baint úsáide as an eolas atá stóráilte in KG. I suíomh tionsclaíoch fíor-dhomhain, baineann sé seo le dul i ngleic le dúshláin iolracha lena n-áirítear nascadh eintiteas, réasúnaíocht ilhop thar KG, etc. Láimhseálann cur chuige traidisiúnta na dúshláin seo ar bhealach seicheamhach modúlach nuair a bhíonn earráidí i modúil iartheachtacha mar thoradh ar earráidí i modúl amháin. . Is minic a bhíonn na dúshláin seo idirghaolmhar agus is féidir leis na réitigh orthu a chéile a neartú nuair a láimhseáiltear iad go comhuaineach i socrú foghlama ceann go ceann. Chuige sin, molaimid múnla il-tasc atá bunaithe ar BERT le Neural Machine Translation (NMT) chun dul i ngleic leis na dúshláin seo. Trí anailís thurgnamhach, léirímid éifeachtúlacht ár gcur chuige molta ar thacar sonraí dílseánaigh amháin atá ar fáil go poiblí.', 'ka': 'Name რეალური მსოფლიოში ინდონტროლიური განსაზღვრებში, ეს შესაძლებელია მრავალური განსაზღვრებების შესახებ, რომელიც ინტერტიკური დაკავშირება, მრავალური ჰოფების განსაზღვრება KG-ზე და განსაზღვრებაში. ტრადიციონალური განსაზღვრებები ამ განსაზღვ ეს გამოცდილებები საშუალოდ შეუძლიათ ერთმანეთს სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა სწავ ამ მიზეზით, ჩვენ მრავალ დავამუშავებთ BERT-ს ნეირალური მაქსინის განაცვლის (NMT) მოდელს ამ გამოსახულებების გარეშე. ექსპერიმენტიური ანალიზის გამოყენებით ჩვენი წარმოდგენის ეფექტიურობა ერთი სახელსაწინო და ერთი სახელსაწინო მონაცემები.', 'hu': 'Kérdésre válaszoló (QA) egy tudásdiagramon (KG) keresztül egy természetes nyelvű (NL) lekérdezés megválaszolása a KG-ban tárolt információk felhasználásával. Egy valós ipari környezetben ez több kihívást is magában foglal, beleértve az entitások összekapcsolását, a KG-val kapcsolatos multi-hop érvelést stb. A hagyományos megközelítések ezeket a kihívásokat modulárisan egymást követő módon kezelik, ahol az egyik modul hibái hibák felhalmozódnak a downstream modulokban. Ezek a kihívások gyakran összefüggnek egymással, és a megoldások erősíthetik egymást, ha egyidejűleg kezelik egy végpontos tanulási rendszerben. Ennek érdekében egy többfeladatos BERT-alapú Neural Machine Translation (NMT) modellt javasolunk, amely megoldja ezeket a kihívásokat. Kísérleti elemzések segítségével egy nyilvánosan elérhető és egy saját tulajdonú adatkészleten mutatjuk be javasolt megközelítésünk hatékonyságát.', 'el': 'Η απάντηση ερωτήσεων (QA) μέσω ενός γραφήματος γνώσης (KG) είναι μια εργασία απάντησης σε ένα ερώτημα φυσικής γλώσσας (NL) χρησιμοποιώντας τις πληροφορίες που αποθηκεύονται στο KG. Σε ένα πραγματικό βιομηχανικό περιβάλλον, αυτό περιλαμβάνει την αντιμετώπιση πολλαπλών προκλήσεων, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της σύνδεσης οντοτήτων, της συλλογιστικής πολλαπλών λυκίδων μέσω κλπ. Οι παραδοσιακές προσεγγίσεις αντιμετωπίζουν αυτές τις προκλήσεις με μορφωματικό διαδοχικό τρόπο όπου τα λάθη σε μια ενότητα οδηγούν στη συσσώρευση σφαλμάτων σε μεταγενέστερες ενότητες. Συχνά αυτές οι προκλήσεις είναι αλληλένδετες και οι λύσεις σε αυτές μπορούν να ενισχύσουν η μία την άλλη όταν αντιμετωπίζονται ταυτόχρονα σε μια εγκατάσταση πλήρους μάθησης. Για το σκοπό αυτό, προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο πολλαπλών εργασιών βασισμένο στο BERT για την αντιμετώπιση αυτών των προκλήσεων. Μέσω πειραματικής ανάλυσης, καταδεικνύουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα της προτεινόμενης προσέγγισής μας σε ένα κοινό διαθέσιμο και ένα ιδιόκτητο σύνολο δεδομένων.', 'it': "La risposta alle domande (QA) su un grafico della conoscenza (KG) consiste nel rispondere a una domanda di linguaggio naturale (NL) utilizzando le informazioni memorizzate in KG. In un contesto industriale reale, questo comporta affrontare molteplici sfide tra cui il collegamento di entità, ragionamento multi-hop su KG, ecc. Gli approcci tradizionali affrontano queste sfide in modo sequenziale modulare, dove gli errori in un modulo portano all'accumulo di errori nei moduli a valle. Spesso queste sfide sono interconnesse e le soluzioni ad esse possono rafforzarsi a vicenda se gestite contemporaneamente in una configurazione di apprendimento end-to-end. A tal fine, proponiamo un modello multi-task basato su BERT Neural Machine Translation (NMT) per affrontare queste sfide. Attraverso analisi sperimentali, dimostriamo l'efficacia del nostro approccio proposto su un set di dati pubblicamente disponibile e proprietario.", 'ms': 'Jawapan soalan (QA) atas graf pengetahuan (KG) adalah tugas menjawab pertanyaan bahasa alami (NL) menggunakan maklumat yang disimpan dalam KG. Dalam tetapan industri dunia nyata, ini melibatkan mengatasi cabaran berbilang termasuk sambungan entiti, alasan berbilang-lompat atas KG, dll. pendekatan tradisional mengendalikan cabaran ini dengan cara berturut-turut modular dimana ralat dalam satu modul membawa kepada akumulasi ralat dalam modul turun. Biasanya cabaran-cabaran ini berkaitan antara satu sama lain dan penyelesaian-penyelesaian untuk mereka boleh saling menguatkan bila ditangani secara bersamaan dalam seting belajar akhir-akhir. Untuk tujuan ini, kami cadangkan model Berdasarkan BERT Perjemahan Mesin Neural (NMT) untuk mengatasi cabaran ini. Melalui analisis percubaan, kami menunjukkan kegunaan pendekatan yang kami cadangkan pada satu set data yang tersedia secara awam dan satu set data yang berkuasa.', 'kk': 'KG- де сақталған мәліметтерді қолдану үшін табиғи тілді (NL) сұраныстың (QA) жауап беру тапсырмасы. Шынымен әлемді индустриалдық баптауларда, бұл бірнеше мәселелерді біріктіру, көпшілік- хопты KG және т. б. және көпшілікті мәселелерді біріктіру модулінде қателерді бағыттау мүмкіндіктерінде қателерді біріктіру үшін әдеттегі мәсе Көбінде бұл мәселелер бір-біріне қатынасыз болып, олардың шешімдері бір-біріне бір-бірінің соңындағы оқыту баптауында көмектесе алады. Бұл үшін бірнеше тапсырманың BERT негіздеген нейрондық машинаның аударуы (NMT) үлгісін таңдаймыз. Тәжірибелі анализ арқылы, біз ұсынылған тәжірибеміздің эффектілігін бір жалпы мәліметті және бір иелекті деректер жиынына көрсетеді.', 'ml': 'Question answering (QA) over a knowledge graph (KG) is a task of answering a natural language (NL) query using the information stored in KG.  ഒരു യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോകത്തിലെ വ്യവസാനത്തില്\u200d, സാധാരണ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത്, സാധാരണ കെജിയെക്കുറിച്ച് ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത്, പല-ഹോപ്പുകളെക്കുറിച്ചും ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത്. പാഠമായ സാധാ പലപ്പോഴും ഈ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d തമ്മിലുള്ള ബന്ധപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അവയ്ക്കുള്ള പരിഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d തമ്മില്\u200d കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യുമ്പോള്\u200d അവസാനം പ ഈ അവസാനത്തിനു വേണ്ടി ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ (NMT) മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. പരീക്ഷണവിശദീകരണത്തിലൂടെ, നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട സമ്പ്രദായത്തിന്റെ പ്രവർത്തനവും ഒരു പ്രവർത്തക വിവരങ്ങളു', 'mt': 'It-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet (QA) fuq grafika tal-għarfien (KG) hija kompitu li twieġeb mistoqsija ta’ lingwa naturali (NL) bl-użu tal-informazzjoni maħżuna f’KG. F’ambjent industrijali tad-dinja reali, dan jinvolvi l-indirizzar ta’ sfidi multipli inklużi l-konnessjoni tal-entitajiet, ir-raġunament multi-hop fuq il-KG, eċċ. Approċċi tradizzjonali jindirizzaw dawn l-isfidi b’mod sekwenzjali modularizzat fejn l-iżbalji f’modulu wieħed iwasslu għall-akkumulazzjoni ta’ żbalji f’moduli downstream. Ta’ spiss dawn l-isfidi huma relatati ma’ xulxin u s-soluzzjonijiet għalihom jistgħu jsaħħu lil xulxin meta jiġu ttrattati simultanjament fi struttura ta’ tagħlim minn tarf għal tarf. Għal dan il-għan, nipproponu mudell ta’ Traduzzjoni tal-Magni Newrali (NMT) ibbażat fuq BERT b’diversi kompiti biex jiġu indirizzati dawn l-isfidi. Through experimental analysis, we demonstrate the efficacy of our proposed approach on one publicly available and one proprietary dataset.', 'mn': 'Мэдлэгийн график (KG) дээр асуулт хариулт (QA) бол байгалийн хэл (NL) квадратыг KG-д хадгалагдсан мэдээллийг ашиглан хариулт өгдөг. Үнэндээ дэлхийн үйлдвэрлэлийн байгууллагуудын тухай олон сорилтуудыг холбох, олон холбоотой KG-ийн тухай ойлголтын тухай асуудалд тусалдаг. Эдгээр сорилтуудыг модуль дахь алдаа нэг модуль доорх модульд алдаа цуглуулах боломжтой болгодог. Эдгээр сорилтууд ихэвчлэн хоорондоо хоорондоо холбоотой бөгөөд тэдний шийдвэрлэл нь нэг нэг хоорондоо хоорондоо холбоотой болох юм. Энэ төгсгөлд бид БЕРТ-д олон даалгавартай мэдрэлийн машин хөрөнгө оруулах (NMT) загварын загварыг санал болгож байна. Ингээд бид туршилтын шинжилгээнд нийтэд ашиглах болон нэг агуулагч өгөгдлийн суурь дээр санал өгсөн арга барилгын үр дүнг үзүүлдэг.', 'mk': 'Одговорот на прашањата (QA) преку график на знаење (KG) е задача да одговара на прашањата на природен јазик (NL) користејќи ги информациите зачувани во KG. In a real-world industrial setting, this involves addressing multiple challenges including entity linking, multi-hop reasoning over KG, etc. Traditional approaches handle these challenges in a modularized sequential manner where errors in one module lead to the accumulation of errors in downstream modules.  Often these challenges are inter-related and the solutions to them can reinforce each other when handled simultaneously in an end-to-end learning setup.  To this end, we propose a multi-task BERT based Neural Machine Translation (NMT) model to address these challenges.  Through experimental analysis, we demonstrate the efficacy of our proposed approach on one publicly available and one proprietary dataset.', 'lt': 'Question answering (QA) over a knowledge graph (KG) is a task of answering a natural language (NL) query using the information stored in KG.  Realaus pasaulio pramonės sąlygomis tai reiškia, kad sprendžiami keli uždaviniai, įskaitant subjektų susiejimą, kelių apynių pagrindimą KG atžvilgiu ir t. t. Tradiciniai metodai sprendžia šiuos uždavinius moduliuojant nuosekliai, kai vieno modulio klaidos sukelia klaidų kaupimąsi tolesniuose moduliuose. Dažnai šie iššūkiai yra tarpusavyje susiję, o jų sprendimai gali stiprinti vienas kitą tuo pačiu metu, kai jie sprendžiami mokymosi pabaigoje sistemoje. Šiuo tikslu siūlome įvairių užduočių BERT pagrįstą neutraliųjų mašinų vertimo (NMT) model į šiems uždaviniams spręsti. Atliekant eksperimentinę analizę įrodome mūsų siūlomo požiūrio veiksmingumą vienoje viešai prieinamoje ir vienoje savarankiškoje duomenų rinkinyje.', 'pl': 'Odpowiedź na pytania (QA) na wykresie wiedzy (KG) to zadanie odpowiedzi na zapytanie języka naturalnego (NL) przy użyciu informacji przechowywanych w KG. W rzeczywistym świecie przemysłowym wiąże się to z rozwiązaniem wielu wyzwań, w tym łączeniem podmiotów, rozumowaniem wielu chmielów nad KG itp. Tradycyjne podejścia radzą sobie z tymi wyzwaniami w sposób modułowy sekwencyjny, gdzie błędy w jednym modułu prowadzą do gromadzenia się błędów w dalszych modułach. Często wyzwania te są ze sobą powiązane, a rozwiązania dla nich mogą się wzajemnie wzmacniać, gdy obsługujemy jednocześnie w kompleksowej konfiguracji uczenia się. W tym celu proponujemy wielozadaniowy model tłumaczenia maszynowego (NMT) oparty na BERT, aby sprostać tym wyzwaniom. Poprzez analizę eksperymentalną demonstrujemy skuteczność proponowanego podejścia na jednym publicznie dostępnym i jednym zastrzeżonym zbiorze danych.', 'no': 'Spørsmålssvar (QA) over eit kunnskapsgraf (KG) er ei oppgåve for å svara på eit naturleg språk (NL) spørsmål med informasjonen lagra i KG. I eit industriell innstilling for verkeleg verda, er dette involvert å handtera fleire utfordringar, inkludert eininga som lenkjer, fleirhopp- rasjon over KG osv. Tradisjonale tilnærmingar handtera desse utfordringane på modularisert sekvensisk måte der feil i ein modul fører til å akumulera feil i nedstrekkmodular. Ofte er desse utfordringane interrelaterte, og løysingane for dei kan styrke kvarandre når dei handterar samtidig i eit læringsoppsett for slutttil slutt. I denne slutten foreslår vi eit multioppgåve BERT-basert neuralmaskinsomsetjingsmodul (NMT) for å handtera desse utfordringane. Gjennom eksperimentell analyse, viser vi effekten av vår foreslått tilnærming på ein offentlig tilgjengeleg og ein eignelig dataset.', 'ro': 'Răspunsul la întrebări (QA) prin intermediul unui grafic de cunoștințe (KG) este o sarcină de a răspunde la o interogare de limbaj natural (NL) folosind informațiile stocate în KG. Într-un cadru industrial real, acest lucru implică abordarea mai multor provocări, inclusiv conectarea entităților, raționamentul multi-hop asupra KG, etc. Abordările tradiționale gestionează aceste provocări într-o manieră secvențială modulară, în cazul în care erorile dintr-un modul duc la acumularea de erori în modulele din aval. Adesea, aceste provocări sunt interconectate, iar soluțiile pentru acestea se pot consolida reciproc atunci când sunt gestionate simultan într-o configurație de învățare end-to-end. În acest scop, propunem un model de traducere automată neurală (NMT) bazat pe mai multe sarcini BERT pentru a aborda aceste provocări. Prin analiza experimentală, demonstrăm eficacitatea abordării propuse pe un set de date disponibil public și proprietar.', 'sr': 'Odgovor na pitanje (QA) za grafik znanja (KG) je zadatak odgovora na prirodni jezik (NL) pitanja korištenjem informacija skladištene u KG. U stvarnom industrijskom postavku, to uključuje rješavanje višestrukih izazova uključujući povezanje entiteta, multihopske razgovore o KG itd. Tradicionalni pristupi rješavaju te izazove na modularisan sekvencijski naèin kada greške u jednom modulu vode do akumulacije greška u nizovim modulima. Često su ovi izazovi međusobno povezani i rešenja za njih mogu pojačati jedno drugo kada se istovremeno rješavaju u uspostavljanju učenja na kraju do kraja. Za taj cilj predlažemo model neurološkog prevoda (NMT) na BERT-u za rješavanje ovih izazova. Kroz eksperimentalnu analizu, pokazujemo efikasnost našeg predloženog pristupa na jednom javno dostupnom i jednom vlasničkom setu podataka.', 'si': 'Name ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ ව්\u200dයාපාරිත්තික සැකසුමේදී, මේක සම්බන්ධ විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් KG ව සමහර වෙලාවට මේ අභ්\u200dයානය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් ඒ වගේම ඔවුන්ට ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් අවසාන මේ අවසානයෙන්, අපි බෙර්ට් අධාරිත වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩක් BERT අධාරිත න්\u200dයූරල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තන (NMT) මදුල පරීක්ෂණ විශ්ලේෂණයෙන් අපි ප්\u200dරතික්ෂා කරනවා අපේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක', 'so': 'Question answering (QA) over a knowledge graph (KG) is a task of answering a natural language (NL) query using the information stored in KG.  Xafiiska ganacsi ee caalamiga ah waxaa ku saabsan in lagu takooro dhibaatooyin kala duduwan, kuwaas oo ka mid ah macluumaad xiriir, sababo badan oo ku saabsan KG, tusaale ahaan qaababka caadooyinka ah waxay u qabanqaabiyaan dhibaatooyinkan si gaar ah, marka qalabka isku noocyo qalabka qalloocan waxay u leedahay in qaladka lagu soo ururiyo modulaha hoose. Inta badan dhibaatooyinkaas waa kuwa la xiriira islamarkaasna xafiisyadu way xoogayn karaan marka la qabsaday dhamaadka waxbarashada. Taas darteed waxaynu soo jeedaynaa model ku saabsan tarjumaadda neural machine (NMT) oo ku saleysan waxyaabo badan oo BERT ah si aan u xambaarano dhibaatadan. Baaritaanka baaritaanka, waxaynu muujinnaa saameyn ku saabsan qaabilaada lagu talo galay in lagu helo hal hadhuudh ah iyo hal sawir ah oo macluumaad faa’iido ah.', 'sv': 'Frågasvar (QA) över en kunskapsgraf (KG) är en uppgift att besvara en naturspråksfråga (NL) med hjälp av informationen lagrad i KG. I en verklig industriell miljö innebär detta att ta itu med flera utmaningar, inklusive entitetskoppling, multi-hop resonemang över KG, etc. Traditionella tillvägagångssätt hanterar dessa utmaningar på ett modulärt sekventiellt sätt där fel i en modul leder till ackumulering av fel i nedströmsmoduler. Ofta är dessa utmaningar inbördes relaterade och lösningarna på dem kan förstärka varandra när de hanteras samtidigt i en end-to-end inlärning setup. Därför föreslår vi en BERT-baserad Neural Machine Translation (NMT) modell med flera uppgifter för att hantera dessa utmaningar. Genom experimentell analys demonstrerar vi effektiviteten av vårt föreslagna tillvägagångssätt på en allmänt tillgänglig och en egen datauppsättning.', 'ta': 'கேள்வி பதில் (QA) அறிவு வரைப்படத்தின் மேல் (KG) ஒரு இயல்பான மொழி( NL) கேள்விக்கு பதிலளிக்க ஒரு செயல் ஒரு உண்மையான உலக தொழில்நுட்பமான அமைப்பில், இது பல சவால்களை சேர்க்கும் பொருள் இணைப்பு, KG மற்றும் பல- hop காரணங்களை சேர்க்கும். பாரம்பரிய வழிகள் ஒரு கூற்றில் பிழைகள் கூறும் பிழைகளை கீழ பெரும்பாலாக இந்த சவால்கள் இணைய தொடர்புகளாக இருக்கும் மற்றும் அவர்களுக்கு தீர்வுகள் ஒன்றாக கையாளும் முடிவு கற்பிக்கை அமைப்பி இந்த முடிவிற்கு, நாம் பல பணிகள் BERT அடிப்படையில் உள்ள நெருக்கி இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (NMT) மாதிரிமாதிரி இந்த சவால்கள சோதனைப்படுத்தல் மூலம், நாம் எங்கள் பரிந்துரைய செயல்பாட்டின் விளைவை காட்டுகிறோம் ஒரு பொது கிடைக்கும் மற்றும் ஒரு வ', 'ur': '(QA) ایک علم گراف (KG) پر سوال جواب دینے کا کام ہے کہ KG میں ذخیره ہوئی معلومات کے مطابق ایک طبیعی زبان (NL) سؤال کی جواب دینے کا کام ہے. ایک حقیقی دنیا کے صنعت میں، یہ ایک موڈولی میں بہت سی چالوں کی تعلق کرنے کے شامل ہے، کجی پر بہت سی-ہپ رابطہ کرنے کے ساتھ، اور اگلے. سنتی طریقے سے ان چالوں کو ایک موڈولی طریقے سے سمجھ لیتے ہیں جہاں ایک موڈولی میں خطا ہیں، ڈونسٹریم موڈولوں میں خطا جمع کرنے کے لئے۔ اغلب یہ چالیاں ایک دوسرے کے ساتھ مرتبہ ہیں اور ان کے حل ایک دوسرے کی مدد کر سکتے ہیں جب ایک دوسرے کو ایک دوسرے کے ساتھ ایک دوسرے کے ساتھ سمجھا جاتا ہے۔ اس کے لئے ہم ایک متعدد-تابع BERT بنیاد نیورل ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں۔ آزمائش تحلیل کے ذریعہ، ہم نے اپنی پیشنهاد کی طریقہ کی تاثیر دکھائی ایک ظاہر موجود اور ایک صاحب دار ڈیٹ سٹ پر۔', 'vi': 'Câu trả lời câu hỏi (QA) qua một đồ thị kiến thức (KG) là nhiệm vụ trả lời câu hỏi ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (lT) bằng thông tin lưu trong KG. Trong một môi trường công nghiệp trên thế giới thực, việc này bao gồm việc giải quyết nhiều thử thách bao gồm việc tổ chức kết nối, lập trình đa căn cứ với KG, v. Những phương pháp truyền thống giải quyết những thử thách theo một cách sắp xếp theo cách sắp xếp khác nhau khi lỗi trong một mô- đun dẫn đến sự tích tụ tập hợp của lỗi trong mô-đun. Thường thì những thử thách này liên kết với nhau và các giải pháp cho chúng có thể củng cố lẫn nhau khi xử lý đồng thời trong một cài đặt học cuối cùng. Với mục đích này, chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình lắp đặt chế tạo máy thần kinh ở sông BERT để giải quyết thử thách này. Qua các phân tích thử nghiệm, chúng tôi chứng minh hiệu quả của phương pháp đã đề nghị với một bộ dữ liệu công khai và một bộ dữ liệu độc quyền.', 'uz': "Name Name Ushbu muammolar bir necha bog'liq bo'lgan va ular bir necha xil o'rganish tugmasining oxiriga boshqarganda bir-бирларини oshirish mumkin. Bu hozir uchun biz bir necha vazifa BERT asosida yangilangan Neural Mashine tarjima modeli (NMT) bilan boshqarishni talab qilamiz. Tekshirish taʼminlovchisi orqali biz talab qilingan bir offentliga mavjud va bir proprietary maʼlumot satrining effektini ko'rsatamiz.", 'bg': 'Отговарянето на въпроси върху графика на знанието (КГ) е задача да се отговори на заявка за естествен език (НН), използвайки информацията, съхранявана в КГ. В реална индустриална обстановка това включва справяне с множество предизвикателства, включително свързване на обекти, мулти-хоп разсъждения върху Традиционните подходи се справят с тези предизвикателства по модулизиран последователен начин, където грешките в един модул водят до натрупване на грешки в модулите надолу по веригата. Често тези предизвикателства са взаимосвързани и решенията за тях могат да се подсилят взаимно, когато се справят едновременно в система за обучение от край до край. За тази цел предлагаме многофункционален модел на невронен машинен превод (НМТ), който да отговори на тези предизвикателства. Чрез експериментален анализ ние демонстрираме ефикасността на нашия предложен подход върху един публично достъпен и един патентован набор от данни.', 'da': 'Spørgsmål besvarelse (QA) over en vidensgraf (KG) er en opgave at besvare en natursprogforespørgsel (NL) ved hjælp af de oplysninger, der er gemt i KG. I en virkelig industriel miljø indebærer dette at tackle flere udfordringer, herunder entity linking, multi-hop ræsonnement over KG osv. Traditionelle tilgange håndterer disse udfordringer på en modulariseret sekventiel måde, hvor fejl i ét modul fører til akkumulering af fejl i downstream moduler. Ofte er disse udfordringer indbyrdes relaterede, og løsningerne på dem kan styrke hinanden, når de håndteres samtidig i en end-to-end læringsopsætning. Til dette formål foreslår vi en multi-task BERT-baseret Neural Machine Translation (NMT) model til at løse disse udfordringer. Gennem eksperimentel analyse demonstrerer vi effektiviteten af vores foreslåede tilgang på et offentligt tilgængeligt og et proprietært datasæt.', 'nl': 'Vragen beantwoorden (QA) over een kennisgrafiek (KG) is een taak om een natuurlijke taalvraag te beantwoorden met behulp van de informatie die in KG is opgeslagen. In een real-world industriële omgeving omvat dit het aanpakken van meerdere uitdagingen, waaronder entity linking, multi-hop redeneering over KG, enz. Traditionele benaderingen behandelen deze uitdagingen op een gemodulariseerde sequentiële manier waarbij fouten in één module leiden tot de accumulatie van fouten in downstream modules. Vaak zijn deze uitdagingen onderling verbonden en kunnen de oplossingen elkaar versterken wanneer ze gelijktijdig worden behandeld in een end-to-end leeropstelling. Daarom stellen we een multi-task BERT gebaseerd Neural Machine Translation (NMT) model voor om deze uitdagingen aan te pakken. Door middel van experimentele analyse demonstreren we de effectiviteit van onze voorgestelde aanpak op één publiek beschikbare en één eigen dataset.', 'de': 'Die Beantwortung von Fragen (QA) über einen Wissensgraphen (KG) ist eine Aufgabe, eine natursprachliche (NL) Abfrage anhand der in KG gespeicherten Informationen zu beantworten. In einer realen industriellen Umgebung bedeutet dies, mehrere Herausforderungen anzugehen, einschließlich Entity Linking, Multi-Hop Reasoning über KG usw. Traditionelle Ansätze behandeln diese Herausforderungen modular sequenziell, wobei Fehler in einem Modul zur Ansammlung von Fehlern in nachgeschalteten Modulen führen. Oft sind diese Herausforderungen miteinander verbunden und ihre Lösungen können sich gegenseitig verstärken, wenn sie gleichzeitig in einem End-to-End-Lern-Setup behandelt werden. Zu diesem Zweck schlagen wir ein Multi-Task BERT-basiertes Neural Machine Translation (NMT) Modell vor, um diese Herausforderungen anzugehen. Durch experimentelle Analysen zeigen wir die Wirksamkeit unseres vorgeschlagenen Ansatzes auf einem öffentlich zugänglichen und einem proprietären Datensatz.', 'id': 'Jawaban pertanyaan (QA) di atas grafik pengetahuan (KG) adalah tugas menjawab pertanyaan bahasa alami (NL) menggunakan informasi yang disimpan di KG. Dalam setting industri dunia nyata, ini melibatkan mengatasi tantangan berbilang termasuk menghubungkan entitas, pemikiran multi-hop atas KG, dll. pendekatan tradisional menangani tantangan-tantangan ini dengan cara sekwensial modularisasi di mana kesalahan dalam satu modul menyebabkan akumulasi kesalahan dalam modul turun. Biasanya tantangan-tantangan ini berhubungan antara satu sama lain dan solusi-solusi untuk mereka dapat saling memperkuat ketika ditangani secara bersamaan dalam seting belajar akhir-akhir. Untuk tujuan ini, kami mengusulkan model Berdasarkan BERT Mesin Neural Translation (NMT) untuk mengatasi tantangan-tantangan ini. Melalui analisis eksperimen, kami menunjukkan efektivitas pendekatan kami yang diusulkan pada satu dataset yang tersedia publik dan satu dataset yang memiliki properti.', 'hr': 'Odgovor na pitanje (QA) na grafiku znanja (KG) je zadatak odgovora na prirodni jezik (NL) pitanja korištenjem informacija skladištene u KG-u. U stvarnom industrijskom postavljanju svijeta to uključuje rješavanje višestrukih izazova uključujući povezanje entitata, multihopske razgovore o KG itd. Tradicionalni pristupi rješavaju te izazove na modularirani sekvencijski način gdje greške u jednom modulu vode do akumulacije greška u nizovim modulima. Često su ovi izazovi međusobno povezani i rješenja za njih mogu se pojačati kada se istovremeno rješavaju u nastavi učenja na kraju do kraja. Za taj cilj predlažemo model neurološkog prevoda (NMT) na BERT-u za rješavanje ovih izazova. Kroz eksperimentalnu analizu pokazujemo djelotvornost našeg predloženog pristupa na jednom javno dostupnom i jednom vlasničkom podatku.', 'fa': 'پاسخ سوال (QA) بر روی گراف دانش (KG) یک کار پاسخ دادن به زبان طبیعی (NL) از اطلاعات ذخیره شده در KG است. در یک تنظیم صنعتی دنیای واقعی، این شامل حل کردن چالش\u200cهای متعدد، شامل ارتباط ارتباط\u200cهای متعدد، دلیل\u200cهای متعدد\u200cهاپ بر روی KG، و غیر از آن است. دسترسی\u200cهای سنتی این چالش\u200cها را به طریق متعدد\u200cشده\u200cای که اشتباه\u200cها در یک مولد به جمع کردن اشتباه\u200cها در مولد پایین\u200c اغلب این چالش\u200cها بین\u200cرابطه\u200cای هستند و راه\u200cحل\u200cهایی برای آنها می\u200cتوانند همدیگر را در حالی که همزمان در یک سازمان یادگیری به پایان رسیده می\u200cشوند کمک کند. برای این قسمت، ما یک مدل ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) بسیار زیادی از کار BERT را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا این چالش\u200cها را حل کند. از طریق تحلیل آزمایشی، ما موثرت دستور پیشنهاد ما را بر یک مجموعه داده\u200cای که در دسترس عمومی و یک مجموعه دارند نشان می\u200cدهیم.', 'sw': 'Swali la kujibu (QA) juu ya picha ya maarifa (KG) ni jukumu la kujibu maswali ya lugha asilia (NL) kwa kutumia taarifa zilizohifadhiwa KG. Katika hali halisi ya viwanda duniani, hii inahusisha kuongeza changamoto mbalimbali ikiwa ni pamoja na entity kuunganisha, jumbe nyingi zinazozungumzia juu ya KG, etc. mbinu za kitamaduni zinakabiliwa na changamoto hizi kwa namna fulani ambapo makosa katika kifaa kimoja kinapelekea kukusanya makosa katika vifaa vya chini mito. Mara nyingi changamoto hizi huwa zinahusiana na hali ya mambo yanayohusiana na suluhisho hizi zinaweza kuunga mkono wakati ambao wanakabiliwa na wakati huo mwishoni mwa ujasiri wa kujifunza. Kwa mwisho huu, tunapendekeza modeli ya utafsiri wa Mashine ya NMT yenye kazi mbalimbali ya BERT ili kutangaza changamoto hizi. Kwa kupitia uchambuzi wa majaribio, tunaonyesha ufanisi wa hatua zetu zilizopendekezwa juu ya kituo kimoja kinachopatikana hadharani na seti moja ya taarifa za proprietary.', 'tr': "Bilim grafından sorag jogap (QA) dogry dilden (NL) soragyny ýok etmek üçin bir täblidir. Gerçek-dünýä endüstri düzümlerde, bu birnäçe kynçylyklary barlamak bilen bir zat baglaşdyrmak bilen, bir multi-hop razylyklary KG we şeýle däl. Däpli ýagdaýda bu kynçylyklary modülerde bir modul içinde hatalaryň toplamagyna sebep edýär. Köplenç bu kynçylyklar birbirlerine görä baglanýan we çözgüler birbirlerine bir gezek soňunda öwrenmeniň düzümlerinde kömek edip biler. Bu üçin, BERT'a daýanýan näral Maşynyň terjimesini (NMT) nusgasyna şu kynçylyklary çözmek üçin bir köp-täblik nusgasyny teklip edýäris. Deneysel analyzasyndan, teklip eden metodamyzyň etkinleşigini publika mejbur we ýeke özümiz bar maglumatyň täsirini görkez.", 'am': 'ጥያቄ (QA) በአውቀት ቋንቋ (KG) በመስጠት ላይ የሚመልስ ስራ ነው በKG ውስጥ የተጠበቀውን መረጃ ተጠቃሚ ነው። በ እውነተኛ ዓለም የኢንተርኔት ግንኙነት፣ ይህ አካባቢ አካባቢ እና በKG ላይ የተጠቃሚ ብዙ አዋቂዎችን በመጨመር የሚችል ብዙዎችን ችሎታዎችን ያሳስባል። ባሕላዊ ጥያቄዎች በአንድ module ውስጥ ስህተት በተሳሳታፊ ክፍተቶችን በመሰብሰብ ይችላሉ፡፡ Often these challenges are inter-related and the solutions to them can reinforce each other when handled simultaneously in an end-to-end learning setup.  ስለዚህ ምክንያት BERT የተቀመጠውን የኔural Machine ትርጓሜ (NMT) ሞዴል እነዚህን ጥቃቄዎች ለመቀበል እናስባለን፡፡ በተፈተና አስተያየት፣ በተዘጋጀው የሥርዓት ሥርዓታችንን በአንዲት ህዝብ በተገኘ እና አንድ የዳታ ማህበረሰብ እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'af': "Vrag antwoord (QA) oor 'n kennis graf (KG) is 'n taak van antwoord na' n natuurlike taal (NL) navraag gebruik die inligting gestoor in Kg. In 'n reël- wêreld industriele instelling, hierdie insluit om veelvuldige uitdagings te adres, insluitend entiteit te koppel, multi- hop redering oor KG, ens. Tradisjoneel toegange het hierdie uitdagings in 'n modulariseerde sekwensiele manier hanteer waar foute in een module lei na die akumulering van foute in onderstreem modules. Gedikwels is hierdie uitdagings interrelasieer en die oplossings vir hulle kan mekaar versterk wanneer eenmaal in 'n einde-tot-einde leer opstelling behandel word. Op hierdie einde voorstel ons 'n multi-taak BERT gebaseerde neurale masjien vertaling (NMT) model om hierdie uitdagings te adres. Deur eksperimenteel analiseer vertoon ons die effektiviteit van ons voorgestelde toegang op een openlik beskikbaar en een eienaardige datastel.", 'sq': 'Përgjigja e pyetjeve (QA) mbi një grafik njohurie (KG) është një detyrë për të përgjigjur një pyetje gjuhës natyrore (NL) duke përdorur informacionin e ruajtur në KG. Në një ambient industrial botërore reale, kjo përfshin trajtimin e sfidave të shumta duke përfshirë lidhjen e njësive, arsyetimin e shumëhopeve mbi KG, etj. Përqasjet tradicionale trajtojnë këto sfida në një mënyrë të moduluar sekuencuese ku gabimet në një modul çojnë në akumulimin e gabimeve në modulet poshtë. Shpesh këto sfida janë të lidhura ndërmjet vete dhe zgjidhjet për ta mund të forcojnë njëri-tjetrin kur trajtohen njëkohësisht në një sistem mësimi nga fundi në fund. Për këtë qëllim, ne propozojmë një model me shumë detyra të bazuar në BERT për të trajtuar këto sfida. Nëpërmjet analizave eksperimentale, ne demonstrojmë efektshmërinë e qasjes sonë të propozuar në një grup të dhënash të disponueshme publikisht dhe të patentuara.', 'hy': 'Question answering (QA) over a knowledge graph (KG) is a task of answering a natural language (NL) query using the information stored in KG.  Իրական աշխարհի արդյունաբերական միջավայրում սա ներառում է բազմաթիվ մարտահրավերներ լուծելը, ներառյալ միավորների կապերը, բազմաթիվ հույսերը KG-ի վերաբերյալ և այլն. ավանդական մոտեցումները լուծվում են այս մարտահրավերներին մոդուլարիզացված հաջորդական կերպ, որտեղ սխալները մեկ մոդուլյում հանգե Հաճախ այս մարտահրավերները միմյանց հետ կապված են, և նրանց լուծումները կարող են իրար ուժեղացնել, երբ դրանք միաժամանակ վերաբերվում են վերջ-վերջ ուսումնասիրության մեջ: Այսպիսով, մենք առաջարկում ենք BER-ի հիմնված բազմախնդիրների նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) մոդել այս մարտահրավերներին լուծելու համար: Փորձարկվող վերլուծության միջոցով մենք ցույց ենք տալիս մեր առաջարկած մոտեցումների արդյունավետությունը մեկ հանրային հասանելի և մեկ սեփական տվյալների համակարգի վրա:', 'bn': 'কে. জ্ঞান গ্রাফ (কে. জি) এর উপর প্রশ্ন উত্তর প্রশ্ন হচ্ছে একটি প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা (এনএল) প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রদান করার কাজ, কে. জি. তে সংরক্ষণ কর বাস্তব বিশ্ব শিল্পের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীতে এটি বেশ কয়েকটি চ্যালেঞ্জের সাথে যুক্ত করেছে, যার মধ্যে আছে বস্তুর লিঙ্ক, বহুহাপ যুক্তি কেজি ইত্যাদি। ঐতিহ্যবাহী পদক্ষেপের মাধ্যমে এই চ্য প্রায়শই এই চ্যালেঞ্জগুলো পরস্পরের সাথে সম্পর্ক এবং তাদের সমাধান একই সাথে শেষ শেষ শেষ পর্যন্ত শিক্ষা ব্যবস্থার সাথে একে অপরকে সাহায এই শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা বেরেট ভিত্তিক নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) মডেল প্রস্তাব করছি এই চ্যালেঞ্জের কথা বলার জন্য। পরীক্ষার বিশ্লেষণের মাধ্যমে আমরা প্রস্তাবিত একটি প্রকাশ্যে প্রস্তাবিত প্রাপ্ত কাজের কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করি এবং একটি প্রার্', 'az': 'Bilim grafı üzərində sual cevapı (QA) KG içində saxlanılan məlumatları istifadə edərək təbiətli dil (NL) soruşmağına cavab verməkdir. Gerçek dünya endüstriyyəti quruluşunda, bu, bircə modüldə xətalar a şağı modullarda xətaların toplamasına yol açan bir çoxlu çətinliklərlə birlikdə, KG üstündə çoxlu-Hop razılaşması və ya da əlaqədir. Bu çətinlər çox çox müxtəlif olanlardır və onların çətinləri bir-birinə son-son öyrənmə qurmasında bir-birinə kömək edə bilər. Buna görə, bu çətinliklərə çəkinmək üçün çoxlu işin BERT tabanlı nöral Makina Çevirməsi (NMT) modeli təklif edirik. Eksperiment analizi vasitəsilə, təklif edilmiş tərzimizin etkinliğini açıq-aşkar mövcuddur və bir mülk veri quruluğuna göstərdik.', 'ko': '지식도(KG)의 퀴즈(QA)는 KG에 저장된 정보를 사용하여 자연어(NL) 조회에 대답하는 임무다.실제 산업 환경에서 이것은 실체 링크, KG의 다중 점프 추리 등 여러 가지 도전을 해결하는 것과 관련된다. 전통적인 방법은 모듈화 순서로 이러한 도전을 처리하는데 그 중 하나의 모듈의 오류는 하위 모듈의 오류가 누적될 수 있다.이러한 도전은 통상적으로 서로 관련되어 있기 때문에 처음부터 끝까지 학습 환경에서 동시에 처리할 때 그들의 해결 방안은 서로 강화될 수 있다.이를 위해 우리는 이러한 도전을 해결하기 위해 멀티퀘스트 버트를 기반으로 한 신경기계번역(NMT) 모델을 제시했다.실험 분석을 통해 우리는 공개적이고 전문적인 데이터 집합에서 우리가 제시한 방법의 유효성을 증명하였다.', 'bs': 'Odgovor na pitanje (QA) na grafiku znanja (KG) je zadatak odgovora na prirodni jezik (NL) pitanja korištenjem informacija skladištene u KG-u. U stvarnom industrijskom stanju na svijetu, to uključuje rješavanje višestrukih izazova uključujući povezanje entitata, multi-hop razgovor nad KG itd. Tradicionalni pristupi rješavaju te izazove na modularisan sekvencijski način gdje greške u jednom modulu vode do akumulacije greška u nizovim modulima. Često su ovi izazovi međusobno povezani i rješenja za njih mogu pojačati jedni druge kada se istovremeno rješavaju u nastavi učenja na kraju do kraja. Za taj cilj predlažemo model neurološkog prevoda (NMT) na BERT-u za rješavanje ovih izazova. Kroz eksperimentalnu analizu, pokazujemo djelotvornost našeg predloženog pristupa na jednom javno dostupnom i jednom vlasničkom setu podataka.', 'cs': 'Odpověď na otázky (QA) přes znalostní graf (KG) je úkol odpovědět na dotaz přirozeného jazyka (NL) pomocí informací uložených v KG. V reálném průmyslovém prostředí to zahrnuje řešení mnoha problémů, včetně propojení entit, multi-hop uvažování přes KG atd. Tradiční přístupy řeší tyto problémy modulárním sekvenčním způsobem, kdy chyby v jednom modulu vedou k hromadění chyb v následných modulech. Často jsou tyto výzvy vzájemně související a jejich řešení se mohou navzájem posílit, pokud se řeší současně v komplexním učebním nastavení. Za tímto účelem navrhujeme víceúlohový model BERT založený na neuronovém strojovém překladu (NMT), který bude řešit tyto výzvy. Prostřednictvím experimentální analýzy demonstrujeme účinnost našeho navrhovaného přístupu na jednom veřejně dostupném a jednom proprietárním datovém souboru.', 'ca': "Question answering (QA) over a knowledge graph (KG) is a task of answering a natural language (NL) query using the information stored in KG.  En un entorn industrial del món real, això implica abordar múltiples reptes, incloent l'enllaç d'entitats, el raonament multi-hop sobre KG, etc. Els enfocaments tradicionals manejen aquests reptes d'una manera seqüencial modularitzada on els errors d'un módul porten a l'acumulació d'errors en móduls avall. Sovint aquests reptes estan interconnectats i les solucions per a ells poden reforçar-se quan es tracten simultàniament en una configuració d'aprenentatge final a final. Per això, proposem un model de traducció de màquines neuronals (NMT) basat en BERT amb moltes tasques per abordar aquests reptes. Amb l'anàlisi experimental, demostram l'eficacia del nostre enfocament proposat en un conjunt de dades públicament disponible i propietaris.", 'et': 'Küsimustele vastamine teadmisgraafiku (KG) üle on looduskeele päringule vastamise ülesanne KG salvestatud teabe abil. Tegelikus tööstuslikus keskkonnas hõlmab see mitmete probleemide lahendamist, sealhulgas üksuste sidumist, mitme hüppega arutlemist KG üle jne Traditsioonilised lähenemisviisid käsitlevad neid probleeme modulariseeritud järjestikusel viisil, kus vead ühes moodulis põhjustavad vigade kogunemise järgmise etapi moodulites. Sageli on need väljakutsed omavahel seotud ja nende lahendused võivad üksteist tugevdada, kui neid käsitletakse samaaegselt lõpuni õppes. Selleks pakume välja mitmeülesandelise BERT-põhise neuromasintõlke (NMT) mudeli nende probleemide lahendamiseks. Eksperimentaalse analüüsi abil näitame oma kavandatud lähenemisviisi efektiivsust ühe avalikult kättesaadava ja ühe omandatud andmekogumi puhul.', 'fi': 'Kysymysten vastaaminen tietograafilla (KG) on luonnollista kieltä koskevaan kyselyyn vastaaminen KG:hen tallennettujen tietojen avulla. Todellisessa teollisessa ympäristössä tämä edellyttää useiden haasteiden käsittelemistä, mukaan lukien entiteettilinkitys, multi-hop-päättely KG:n yli jne. Perinteiset lähestymistavat käsittelevät näitä haasteita modulaarisesti peräkkäin, jossa yhden moduulin virheet johtavat virheiden kertymiseen jatkojalostusmoduuleihin. Usein nämä haasteet liittyvät toisiinsa ja niihin liittyvät ratkaisut voivat vahvistaa toisiaan, kun niitä käsitellään samanaikaisesti päästä päähän -oppimisympäristössä. Tätä varten ehdotamme monitehtäväpohjaista BERT-pohjaista neurokonekäännösmallia näiden haasteiden ratkaisemiseksi. Kokeellisen analyysin avulla osoitamme ehdotetun lähestymistapamme tehokkuuden yhdessä julkisesti saatavilla olevassa ja yhdessä patentoidussa aineistossa.', 'he': 'Question answering (QA) over a knowledge graph (KG) is a task of answering a natural language (NL) query using the information stored in KG.  במסגרת תעשיית בעולם האמיתי, זה כולל להתמודד עם אתגרים רבים כולל קשר יחסי ישויות, הגיון multi-hop מעל KG, וכו"כ. גישות מסורתיות מטפלות באתגרים אלה באופן רצופי מודולרי שבו שגיאות במודול אחד מובילות לאספת שגיאות במודולים התחתונים. Often these challenges are inter-related and the solutions to them can reinforce each other when handled simultaneously in an end-to-end learning setup.  To this end, we propose a multi-task BERT based Neural Machine Translation (NMT) model to address these challenges.  Through experimental analysis, we demonstrate the efficacy of our proposed approach on one publicly available and one proprietary dataset.', 'ha': "Socket error code ConnectionTimeout Daga wani muhalli na cikin kimar da ke cikin kashi, wannan yana amfani da wato masu yawa kamar masu haɗi da ma'anar abubuwa, da masu haɗi masu multi-juma masu hankali da KG, ko kuma hanyoyin zartar da waɗannan masu hanyõyi a bayani-bayani, inda ɓatattu cikin moda guda ta ƙara ko kuma yana ƙara cikin shirin ayuka. Often these challenges are inter-related and the solutions to them can reinforce each other when handled simultaneously in an end-to-end learning setup.  Ga wannan, Munã goyyar da wani misalin tarjima na BERT a Basin Taural Mashine na Neural (NMT) dõmin su yi addu'a ga waɗannan tsohon. Ga bayan rabo, za mu nuna aikin hanyarmu wanda aka yi niyyar mu da hanyarsa a kan guda da bayani, da kuma sakin bayani guda.", 'sk': 'Odgovarjanje na vprašanja (QA) prek grafikona znanja (KG) je naloga odgovora na poizvedbo naravnega jezika (NL) z uporabo informacij, shranjenih v KG. V resničnem industrijskem okolju to vključuje reševanje več izzivov, vključno s povezovanjem entitet, razmišljanjem o več postopkih KG itd. Tradicionalni pristopi obravnavajo te izzive modularizirano zaporedno, kjer napake v enem modulu vodijo do kopičenja napak v modulih nadaljnje verige. Ti izzivi so pogosto medsebojno povezani in rešitve zanje se lahko medsebojno okrepijo, če jih obravnavamo hkrati v sistemu učenja od konca do konca. V ta namen predlagamo večopravilni BERT-ov model nevralnega strojnega prevajanja (NMT) za reševanje teh izzivov. Z eksperimentalno analizo dokazujemo učinkovitost našega predlaganega pristopa na enem javno dostopnem in enem lastniškem naboru podatkov.', 'jv': 'Name Nang setung manus sing wis ana, sing mau nggawe perbudhakan liyane karo hal-perbudhakan liyane, iso nggawe barang-knop liyane karo KG, njl. Awak dhéwé sing perusahaan karo hal-perusahaan sing iki dadi sing beraksi segala macerakan sampek modulusan sampek ana Laptop" and "Desktop Nyong barêng-barêng iki, kita mulungi model sing bisa multi-task BERT basa, gambar na sistem Nyural Manus Terjamahan (NMT) kanggo nganggo cara-cara sing iki. Ato hal-hal dadi sing paling-alaman gak dhéwé mungkut gak dhéwé nggawe perusahaan nik akeh nggawe dataset sing gak dhéwé.', 'bo': 'KG ནང་དུ་ཉར་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ In a real-world industrial setting, this involves addressing multiple challenges including entity linking, multi-hop reasoning over KG, etc. Traditional approaches handle these challenges in a modularized sequential manner where errors in one module lead to the accumulation of errors in downstream modules. Often these challenges are inter-related and the solutions to them can reinforce each other when handled simultaneously in an end-to-end learning setup. མཇུག་མ་དེ་ལྟར། འུ་ཅག་གིས་BERT་ལ་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་ཡོད་པའི་མིག དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ལས། ང་ཚོས་མི་མང་ཆོས་ཐོག་ཏུ་འཇུག'}
{'en': 'Communicative-Function-Based Sentence Classification for Construction of an Academic Formulaic Expression Database', 'ar': 'تصنيف الجمل القائم على التواصل القائم على الوظيفة لبناء قاعدة بيانات التعبير الصيغ الأكاديمية', 'pt': 'Classificação de sentença baseada em função comunicativa para construção de um banco de dados de expressões de fórmulas acadêmicas', 'es': 'Clasificación de oraciones basada en funciones comunicativas para la construcción de una base de datos de expresiones académicas', 'fr': "Classification des phrases basée sur la fonction communicative pour la construction d'une base de données d'expressions formuelles académiques", 'hi': 'एक अकादमिक सूत्रीय अभिव्यक्ति डेटाबेस के निर्माण के लिए संचार-फ़ंक्शन-आधारित वाक्य वर्गीकरण', 'ja': '学術式表現データベース構築のためのコミュニケーション機能ベースの文章分類', 'ru': 'Коммуникативно-функциональная классификация предложений для построения академической базы данных формульных выражений', 'zh': '盖交际功能之句类,以构学术公式表达式数据库', 'ga': 'Aicmiú Pianbhreithe Cumarsáideach-Bhunaithe chun Bunachar Sonraí Léirithe Foirmle Acadúla a Thógáil', 'ka': 'Comment', 'el': 'Ταξινόμηση προτάσεων βάσει επικοινωνιακών λειτουργιών για την κατασκευή μιας ακαδημαϊκής βάσης δεδομένων τυπικών εκφράσεων', 'hu': 'Kommunikációs funkció alapú mondatsorolás egy tudományos képleti kifejezési adatbázis építéséhez', 'it': 'Classificazione delle frasi basata sulla funzione comunicativa per la costruzione di un database di espressioni formulaiche accademiche', 'kk': 'Коммуникациялық функциясы негіздеген сөз классификациясы академикалық формулалық өрнектер деректер қорының құрылуы үшін', 'lt': 'Komunikacinės funkcijos pagrindu pagrįsto bausmės klasifikavimas akademinės formulės išraiškos duomenų bazės kūrimui', 'mk': 'Класификација на пресуди базирана на комуникационална функција за изградба на академска база на податоци за формални изрази', 'ml': 'ആകേഡിമിക്ക് ഫോമുലിക് എക്സ്പ്രഷന്\u200d ഡേറ്റാബേസിനുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനമായ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ക്ലാസിഷന്\u200d ചെയ്യുക', 'ms': 'Klasifikasi Hukuman Berasas-Fungsi Komunikasi untuk Bina Pangkalan Data ungkapan Formula Akademik', 'mn': 'Холбоотой-функц-суурилсан өгүүлбэрийн санг бүтээхэд', 'mt': 'Communicative-Function-Based Sentence Classification for Construction of an Academic Formulaic Expression Database', 'ro': 'Clasificarea sentințelor bazate pe funcții comunicative pentru construirea unei baze de date cu expresii formule academice', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'Klasyfikacja zdań komunikatywno-funkcyjnych dla budowy akademickiej bazy wyrażeń formułowych', 'sr': 'Komunikativno-funkcionalno-bazirana kazna klasifikacija za izgradnju akademičke formularne baze podataka izraza', 'sv': 'Kommunikativ funktionsbaserad meningsklassificering för konstruktion av en databas med akademiska formulära uttryck', 'so': 'Muujinta-Function-Based Sentence Classification for Construction an Academic Formulaic Expression Database', 'si': 'Comment', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'کمونکیٹیو-فونس-بنیادی سنٹنس کلاسیفی ایک اکسیڈمی فورمولیک اکسپیشن ڈیٹابیس بنانے کے لئے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Truyền thuyết hàm hàm hàm ứng dụng cho việc xây dựng dữ liệu tiêu biểu khoa học', 'bg': 'Комуникативно-функционална класификация на изреченията за изграждане на академична база данни за формулирани изрази', 'nl': 'Communicatief-Function-Based Zinnclassificatie voor de opbouw van een Academische Formulaïsche Expressie Database', 'da': 'Kommunikativ funktionsbaseret sætningsklassificering til opførelse af en akademisk formularisk udtryksdatabase', 'id': 'Klasifikasi Hukuman Berdasarkan Fungsi Komunikasi untuk Konstruksi Database Ekspresi Formula Akademik', 'hr': 'Komunikacijska funkcionalna klasifikacija kazne za izgradnju akademičke formularne baze podataka izraza', 'de': 'Kommunikativ-funktionsbasierte Satzklassifizierung für den Aufbau einer akademischen Formularischen Ausdrucksdatenbank', 'fa': 'کلاس\u200cبندی مجوز\u200cهای ارتباطی-عملکرد برای ساختن یک داده\u200cی داده\u200cی نمایش\u200cهای فرمولی دانشمند', 'af': 'Comment', 'sq': 'Klasifikimi i dënimeve bazuar në funksionin komunikues për ndërtimin e një baze të dhënash akademike të shprehjes formulare', 'sw': 'Communicative-Function-Based Sentence Classification for Construction of an Academic Formulaic Expression Database', 'ko': '교제 기능을 바탕으로 하는 문장 분류법으로 학술 공식화 표현 데이터베이스 구축', 'tr': 'Çot', 'am': 'ቦታ', 'az': 'Akademik Formulaq İfadə Verici Vericisinin Yapılması üçün Kommunikatif-Funksiya-Based Sözü Klasifikasyonu', 'bn': 'একাডেমিক্যাল ফরমালিক এক্সপ্রেশন ডাটাবেস নির্মাণের জন্য যোগাযোগ- ফাংশন-ভিত্তিক শাস্তি শ্রেণীকরণ', 'bs': 'Komunikacijska funkcionalna klasifikacija kazne za izgradnju akademičke formularne baze podataka izraza', 'cs': 'Klasifikace vět založená na komunikaci a funkcích pro konstrukci akademické databáze formulářských výrazů', 'ca': "Classificació de sentences basada en funcions comunicatives per la construcció d'una base de dades d'expressió fòrmula acadèmica", 'et': 'KommunikatiivfunktsioonipĂ”hine lauseklassifikatsioon akadeemilise valemi vĂ€ljenduse andmebaasi ehitamiseks', 'hy': 'Comment', 'fi': 'Kommunikatiivinen funktiopohjainen lauseluokitus akateemisen kaavailmaisutietokannan rakentamiseksi', 'jv': 'Komunicatve-funksi-basic Sentense', 'sk': 'Klasifikacija stavkov na osnovi komunikacijskih funkcij za gradnjo akademske formulacijske baze izrazov', 'he': 'מסווג גזר מבוסס על תפקיד תקשורת לבניית בסיס מידע פורמולית אקדמית', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Communicative-Function-Based Sentence Classification for Construction of an Academic Formulaic Expression Database'}
{'en': 'Formulaic expressions (FEs), such as ‘in this paper, we propose’ are frequently used in scientific papers. FEs convey a communicative function (CF), i.e. ‘showing the aim of the paper’ in the above-mentioned example. Although CF-labelled FEs are helpful in assisting academic writing, the construction of FE databases requires manual labour for assigning CF labels. In this study, we considered a fully automated construction of a CF-labelled FE database using the topdown approach, in which the CF labels are first assigned to sentences, and then the FEs are extracted. For the CF-label assignment, we created a CF-labelled sentence dataset, on which we trained a SciBERT classifier. We show that the classifier and dataset can be used to construct FE databases of disciplines that are different from the training data. The accuracy of in-disciplinary classification was more than 80 %, while cross-disciplinary classification also worked well. We also propose an FE extraction method, which was applied to the CF-labelled sentences. Finally, we constructed and published a new, large CF-labelled FE database. The evaluation of the final CF-labelled FE database showed that approximately 65 % of the FEs are correct and useful, which is sufficiently high considering practical use.', 'ar': 'كثيرًا ما تُستخدم التعبيرات الصيغية (FEs) ، مثل "في هذه الورقة ، نقترح" في الأوراق العلمية. تنقل FEs وظيفة اتصال (CF) ، أي "إظهار هدف الورقة" في المثال المذكور أعلاه. على الرغم من أن FEs التي تحمل علامة CF مفيدة في مساعدة الكتابة الأكاديمية ، فإن إنشاء قواعد بيانات FE يتطلب عملاً يدويًا لتعيين تسميات CF. في هذه الدراسة ، نظرنا في إنشاء مؤتمت بالكامل لقاعدة بيانات FE تحمل علامة CF باستخدام النهج من أعلى إلى أسفل ، حيث يتم تخصيص تسميات CF أولاً للجمل ، ثم يتم استخراج FEs. بالنسبة لمهمة CF-label ، أنشأنا مجموعة بيانات الجمل التي تحمل علامة CF ، والتي قمنا بتدريب مصنف SciBERT عليها. نوضح أنه يمكن استخدام المصنف ومجموعة البيانات لإنشاء قواعد بيانات FE للتخصصات التي تختلف عن بيانات التدريب. كانت دقة التصنيف في التخصصات أكثر من 80٪ ، بينما نجح التصنيف متعدد التخصصات أيضًا. نقترح أيضًا طريقة استخراج FE ، والتي تم تطبيقها على الجمل التي تحمل علامة CF. أخيرًا ، أنشأنا ونشرنا قاعدة بيانات FE جديدة كبيرة تحمل علامة CF. أظهر تقييم قاعدة بيانات FE النهائية المسمى CF أن ما يقرب من 65 ٪ من FEs صحيحة ومفيدة ، وهي نسبة عالية بما يكفي بالنظر إلى الاستخدام العملي.', 'pt': "Expressões formuladas (FEs), como 'neste artigo, propomos' são frequentemente usadas em artigos científicos. FEs transmitem uma função comunicativa (CF), ou seja, 'mostrando o objetivo do artigo' no exemplo acima mencionado. Embora os EFs rotulados como CF sejam úteis para auxiliar na redação acadêmica, a construção de bancos de dados de EF requer trabalho manual para atribuir rótulos de CF. Neste estudo, consideramos uma construção totalmente automatizada de um banco de dados EF rotulado CF usando a abordagem top-down, na qual os rótulos CF são atribuídos primeiro a sentenças e, em seguida, os EFs são extraídos. Para a atribuição do rótulo CF, criamos um conjunto de dados de frases rotulados pelo CF, no qual treinamos um classificador SciBERT. Mostramos que o classificador e o conjunto de dados podem ser usados para construir bancos de dados de EF de disciplinas diferentes dos dados de treinamento. A precisão da classificação interdisciplinar foi superior a 80%, enquanto a classificação interdisciplinar também funcionou bem. Também propomos um método de extração EF, que foi aplicado às sentenças marcadas com CF. Finalmente, construímos e publicamos um novo e grande banco de dados de EF marcado com CF. A avaliação do banco de dados final de EF marcados com CF mostrou que aproximadamente 65% dos EFs estão corretos e úteis, o que é suficientemente alto considerando o uso prático.", 'fr': "Les expressions de formule (FE), telles que «\xa0dans cet article, nous proposons\xa0» sont fréquemment utilisées dans les articles scientifiques. Les FE ont une fonction communicative (CF), c'est-à-dire «\xa0montrer l'objectif du document\xa0» dans l'exemple ci-dessus. Bien que les FE labellisés CF soient utiles pour faciliter la rédaction académique, la construction de bases de données FE nécessite un travail manuel pour attribuer des étiquettes CF. Dans cette étude, nous avons envisagé une construction entièrement automatisée d'une base de données FE labellisée CF utilisant l'approche descendante, dans laquelle les étiquettes CF sont d'abord attribuées à des phrases, puis les FE sont extraits. Pour le devoir d'étiquette CF, nous avons créé un jeu de données de phrases étiquetées CF, sur lequel nous avons formé un classificateur SciBert. Nous montrons que le classificateur et l'ensemble de données peuvent être utilisés pour construire des bases de données FE de disciplines différentes des données d'entraînement. La précision de la classification intra-disciplinaire était de plus de 80\xa0%, tandis que la classification interdisciplinaire fonctionnait également bien. Nous proposons également une méthode d'extraction FE, qui a été appliquée aux phrases étiquetées CF. Enfin, nous avons créé et publié une nouvelle grande base de données FE labellisée CF. L'évaluation de la base de données finale sur les FE labellisée CF a montré qu'environ 65\xa0% des FE sont corrects et utiles, ce qui est suffisamment élevé compte tenu de l'utilisation pratique.", 'es': 'Las expresiones de fórmula (FE), como «en este artículo, proponemos», se utilizan con frecuencia en artículos científicos. Las FE transmiten una función comunicativa (CF), es decir, «mostrar el objetivo del documento» en el ejemplo mencionado anteriormente. Aunque los FE etiquetados con CF son útiles para ayudar a la redacción académica, la construcción de bases de datos de FE requiere trabajo manual para asignar etiquetas de CF. En este estudio, se consideró una construcción totalmente automatizada de una base de datos de FE etiquetada con CF utilizando el enfoque descendente, en el que las etiquetas de CF se asignan primero a las oraciones y luego se extraen las FE. Para la asignación de la etiqueta CF, creamos un conjunto de datos de oraciones etiquetadas con CF, en el que entrenamos un clasificador SciBert. Mostramos que el clasificador y el conjunto de datos se pueden utilizar para construir bases de datos de FE de disciplinas que son diferentes de los datos de entrenamiento. La precisión de la clasificación interdisciplinaria fue superior al 80%, mientras que la clasificación interdisciplinaria también funcionó bien. También proponemos un método de extracción de FE, que se aplicó a las oraciones etiquetadas con CF. Finalmente, construimos y publicamos una nueva base de datos de FE grande etiquetada con CF. La evaluación de la base de datos final de FE marcada con CF mostró que aproximadamente el 65% de las FE son correctas y útiles, lo que es suficientemente alto considerando el uso práctico.', 'ja': '『本稿では、提案する』などの数式表現（ FE ）は、科学論文で頻繁に使用されている。 上記の例では、FEはコミュニケーション機能（ CF ）、すなわち「論文の目的を示す」機能を伝達する。 CFラベル付きFEは学術的な執筆を支援するのに役立ちますが、FEデータベースの構築には、CFラベルを割り当てるための手作業が必要です。 本研究では、まずCFラベルを文章に割り当て、次にFEを抽出する、トップダウンアプローチを使用したCFラベル付きFEデータベースの完全自動構築を検討した。 CFラベルの割り当てのために、CFラベルの文データセットを作成し、SciBERT分類子をトレーニングしました。 分類子とデータセットは、トレーニングデータとは異なる分野のFEデータベースを構築するために使用できることを示しています。 学際的な分類の精度は80 ％以上であり、学際的な分類もうまくいきました。 また、CF標識文に適用したFE抽出法も提案している。 最後に、新しい大規模なCFラベルのFEデータベースを構築し、公開しました。 最終的なCF標識FEデータベースの評価では、約65%のFEが正しく有用であることが示され、実用性を考慮すると十分に高い。', 'hi': "Formulaic expressions (FEs), जैसे 'इस पेपर में, हम प्रस्तावित करते हैं' अक्सर वैज्ञानिक पत्रों में उपयोग किए जाते हैं। एफई एक संचार फ़ंक्शन (सीएफ) व्यक्त करते हैं, यानी उपर्युक्त उदाहरण में 'पेपर के उद्देश्य को दिखाते हुए'। यद्यपि सीएफ-लेबल वाले एफई अकादमिक लेखन में सहायता करने में सहायक होते हैं, एफई डेटाबेस के निर्माण के लिए सीएफ लेबल असाइन करने के लिए मैनुअल श्रम की आवश्यकता होती है। इस अध्ययन में, हमने शीर्ष-डाउन दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग करके सीएफ-लेबल वाले एफई डेटाबेस के पूरी तरह से स्वचालित निर्माण पर विचार किया, जिसमें सीएफ लेबल को पहले वाक्यों को सौंपा जाता है, और फिर एफई निकाले जाते हैं। सीएफ-लेबल असाइनमेंट के लिए, हमने एक सीएफ-लेबल वाले वाक्य डेटासेट बनाए, जिस पर हमने एक SciBERT क्लासिफायर को प्रशिक्षित किया। हम दिखाते हैं कि क्लासिफायर और डेटासेट का उपयोग उन विषयों के एफई डेटाबेस बनाने के लिए किया जा सकता है जो प्रशिक्षण डेटा से अलग हैं। इन-डिसिप्लिनरी वर्गीकरण की सटीकता 80% से अधिक थी, जबकि क्रॉस-अनुशासनात्मक वर्गीकरण ने भी अच्छी तरह से काम किया। हम एक एफई निष्कर्षण विधि का भी प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिसे सीएफ-लेबल वाले वाक्यों पर लागू किया गया था। अंत में, हमने एक नया, बड़ा सीएफ-लेबल एफई डेटाबेस का निर्माण और प्रकाशन किया। अंतिम सीएफ-लेबल वाले एफई डेटाबेस के मूल्यांकन से पता चला है कि लगभग 65% एफई सही और उपयोगी हैं, जो व्यावहारिक उपयोग पर विचार करते हुए पर्याप्त रूप से उच्च है।", 'ru': 'Формулярные выражения (FE), такие как «в этой статье, мы предлагаем» , часто используются в научных работах. FE передают коммуникативную функцию (CF), то есть «показывая цель работы» в вышеупомянутом примере. Хотя FE с маркировкой CF полезны в помощи академической письменности, создание баз данных FE требует ручного труда для присвоения маркировки CF. В этом исследовании мы рассмотрели полностью автоматизированное построение базы данных CF-меченых FE с использованием нисходящего подхода, в котором CF-метки сначала присваиваются предложениям, а затем извлекаются FE. Для назначения CF-меток мы создали набор данных CF-меченных предложений, на котором обучили классификатор SciBERT. Показано, что классификатор и датасет могут быть использованы для построения баз данных КЭ дисциплин, отличающихся от данных обучения. Точность внутридисциплинарной классификации составляла более 80%, в то время как междисциплинарная классификация также хорошо работала. Мы также предлагаем метод экстракции FE, который применялся к предложениям с маркировкой CF. Наконец, мы создали и опубликовали новую, крупную базу данных FE с CF-мечением. Оценка окончательной базы данных CF-меченых FE показала, что приблизительно 65% FE являются правильными и полезными, что является достаточно высоким с учетом практического использования.', 'zh': '公式化表达式(FEs)如"在本文中,我辈言"在科学论文中常用。 FE传交际功能(CF),即上例"示论文"也。 虽CF标FE助学,FE数据库构须手动分CF。 于此论之,臣等思用自上而下者自动化立CF标之FE数据库,其CF标先给句,然后取FE。 CF 标赋值,创 CF 数集,练 SciBERT 分类器其上。 臣等明器数可施于学科 FE 数据库。 学科内类准确率过80%,而跨学科类亦行善。 又立FE取法,当用CF标记之句。 最后构成一新CF标记FE数据库。 终CF标有限元数据库之评,盖65%之有限元为正用,虑其实用,足以高矣。', 'ga': "Is minic a úsáidtear nathanna foirmiúla (FEs), mar ‘sa pháipéar seo, a mholaimid’ i bpáipéir eolaíochta. Cuireann FEanna feidhm chumarsáideach (CF) in iúl, i.e. ‘a léiríonn aidhm an pháipéir’ sa sampla thuasluaite. Cé go gcuidíonn FEanna a bhfuil lipéad CF orthu chun cuidiú leis an scríbhneoireacht acadúil, teastaíonn obair láimhe chun lipéid CF a shannadh chun bunachair shonraí FE a thógáil. Sa staidéar seo, rinneamar breithniú ar thógáil lán-uathoibrithe de bhunachar sonraí FE lipéadaithe CF ag baint úsáide as an gcur chuige ó bharr anuas, ina sanntar na lipéid CF ar abairtí ar dtús, agus ansin baintear na FEanna. Maidir leis an tasc lipéad CF, chruthaíomar tacar sonraí abairtí CF-lipéadaithe, ar a ndearnamar oiliúint ar aicmitheoir SciBERT. Léirímid gur féidir an t-aicmitheoir agus an tacar sonraí a úsáid chun bunachair shonraí breisoideachais a chruthú de dhisciplíní atá difriúil ó na sonraí oiliúna. Bhí cruinneas an aicmithe indisciplíneach níos mó ná 80%, agus d'oibrigh an t-aicmiú trasdisciplíneach go maith freisin. Molaimid freisin modh eastósctha FE, a cuireadh i bhfeidhm ar na habairtí a bhfuil lipéad CF orthu. Ar deireadh, chuireamar le chéile agus d’fhoilsíomar bunachar sonraí mór nua FE ar a bhfuil lipéad CF. Léiríodh sa mheastóireacht ar an mbunachar sonraí FE deiridh ar a bhfuil lipéad CF go bhfuil thart ar 65% de na FEanna ceart agus úsáideach, atá ard go leor ag cur san áireamh úsáid phraiticiúil.", 'ka': "ფორმულური გამოსახულებები (FES), როგორც `ამ დონეში, ჩვენ გვეძებნა' ხშირად გამოყენება მეცნიერო დონეტებში. FEs-ს კომუნიკაციური ფუნქცია (CF), მაგალითად „გვერდის მისამართი ჩვენება” მაგალითად ამოსახულებული მაგალითად. მაგრამ CF-ს მართლა FES იყენებენ აკადემიკური წერილების დახმარებისთვის, FE მონაცემების ბაზების შექმნა უნდა მართლა მუშაობა CF-ის მართლა დააყენება. ამ კვლევაში, ჩვენ აღმოვაჩნეთ საუკეთესო ავტომატიური შექმნა FE ბაზატური დანაწილების, რომელიც საუკეთესო დანაწილების გამოყენებათ, რომელიც CF ნიშანები პირველად აღმოჩნენ სიტყვებ CF-მართლის მისამართლად, ჩვენ შექმნა CF-მართლიერი მონაცემების შესამართლა, რომელიც ჩვენ SciBERT კლასიფიკაციას განვიყავეთ. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ კლასიფიკაციური და მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია შეიძლება გამოყენება FE დისპლინტების მონაცემები, რომლებიც განსხვავებული განსხვავებული სიციპლიონალური კლასიფიკაციის წარმოდგენება 80%-ზე მეტია, მაგრამ cross-disciplinary classification also worked well. ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ FE ექსტრექციის მეთოდი, რომელიც CF-ნიშნავული სიტყვებისთვის გამოყენებულია. საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ შევქმნით და გამოვაღწერეთ ახალი, დიდი CF-ნიშვნელი FE დაბაზა. FE ბაზატის დაბრუნებული CF-ის განსაზღვრება დააჩვენეთ, რომ ფანჯარა 65% მარტივია და გამოიყენებელია, რომელიც უფრო მარტივია პრაქტიკური გამოყენება.", 'el': 'Οι τυπικές εκφράσεις, όπως "σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε" χρησιμοποιούνται συχνά σε επιστημονικές εργασίες. Οι FEs μεταδίδουν μια επικοινωνιακή λειτουργία (CF), δηλαδή "επίδειξη του στόχου της εργασίας" στο προαναφερθέν παράδειγμα. Αν και οι ΦΑ με σήμανση βοηθούν στην ακαδημαϊκή συγγραφή, η κατασκευή βάσεων δεδομένων απαιτεί χειρωνακτική εργασία για την εκχώρηση ετικετών CF. Σε αυτή τη μελέτη, εξετάσαμε μια πλήρως αυτοματοποιημένη κατασκευή μιας βάσης δεδομένων FE με ετικέτα CF χρησιμοποιώντας την προσέγγιση από πάνω προς τα κάτω, στην οποία οι ετικέτες CF αντιστοιχούν πρώτα σε προτάσεις και στη συνέχεια εξάγονται οι ΦΑ. Για την ανάθεση ετικετών δημιουργήσαμε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων προτάσεων με ετικέτα CF, στο οποίο εκπαιδεύσαμε έναν ταξινομητή SciBERT. Δείχνουμε ότι ο ταξινομητής και το σύνολο δεδομένων μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν για την κατασκευή βάσεων δεδομένων των κλάδων που διαφέρουν από τα δεδομένα κατάρτισης. Η ακρίβεια της διεπιστημονικής ταξινόμησης ήταν πάνω από 80%, ενώ η διεπιστημονική ταξινόμηση λειτούργησε επίσης καλά. Προτείνουμε επίσης μια μέθοδο εξαγωγής η οποία εφαρμόστηκε στις προτάσεις με ετικέτα CF. Τέλος, κατασκευάσαμε και δημοσιεύσαμε μια νέα, μεγάλη βάση δεδομένων FE με ετικέτα CF. Η αξιολόγηση της τελικής βάσης δεδομένων FE με σήμανση CF έδειξε ότι περίπου 65% των FE είναι σωστές και χρήσιμες, γεγονός που είναι αρκετά υψηλό λαμβάνοντας υπόψη την πρακτική χρήση.', 'hu': 'A tudományos tanulmányokban gyakran használják a képleti kifejezéseket, mint például "ebben a tanulmányban javasoljuk". Az FE kommunikációs funkciót (CF) közvetít, azaz a fent említett példában "bemutatja a dolgozat célját". Bár a CF-jelöléssel ellátott FE-k segítenek az akadémiai írásban, az FE-adatbázisok létrehozásához manuális munkát igényelnek a CF-címkék kiosztásához. Ebben a tanulmányban egy CF-jelöléssel ellátott FE adatbázis teljesen automatizált felépítését vizsgáltuk, felülről lefelé irányuló megközelítést alkalmazva, amelyben a CF címkéket először mondatokhoz rendeljük, majd kivonjuk a FE-ket. A CF-label hozzárendeléshez létrehoztunk egy CF-jelöléssel ellátott mondat adatkészletet, amelyre egy SciBERT osztályozót képeztünk. Megmutatjuk, hogy az osztályozó és az adatkészlet felhasználható a képzési adatoktól eltérő tudományágak FE adatbázisához. A diszciplináris osztályozás pontossága több mint 80%, míg a diszciplináris osztályozás is jól működött. Javasoljuk továbbá az FE extrakciós módszert, amelyet a CF jelöléssel ellátott mondatokra alkalmaztak. Végül létrehoztunk és publikáltunk egy új, nagy CF-jelzésű FE adatbázist. A CF-jelöléssel ellátott végleges FE-adatbázis értékelése azt mutatta, hogy az FE-k körülbelül 65%-a helyes és hasznos, ami a gyakorlati felhasználás tekintetében kellően magas.', 'it': 'Le espressioni formulaiche (FE), come `in questo articolo, proponiamo\' sono spesso utilizzate in articoli scientifici. Le FE trasmettono una funzione comunicativa (CF), cioè "mostrando lo scopo dell\'articolo" nell\'esempio sopra citato. Sebbene le FE con marchio CF siano utili per aiutare la scrittura accademica, la costruzione di database FE richiede lavoro manuale per l\'assegnazione di etichette CF. In questo studio, abbiamo considerato una costruzione completamente automatizzata di un database FE etichettato CF utilizzando l\'approccio top-down, in cui le etichette CF vengono prima assegnate alle frasi e poi estratte le FE. Per l\'assegnazione dell\'etichetta CF, abbiamo creato un set di dati di frase etichettato CF, sul quale abbiamo formato un classificatore SciBERT. Mostriamo che il classificatore e il dataset possono essere utilizzati per costruire database FE di discipline diverse dai dati formativi. L\'accuratezza della classificazione interdisciplinare è stata superiore all\'80%, mentre anche la classificazione interdisciplinare ha funzionato bene. Proponiamo anche un metodo di estrazione FE, che è stato applicato alle frasi marcate CF. Infine, abbiamo costruito e pubblicato un nuovo, grande database FE etichettato CF. La valutazione della banca dati finale FE contrassegnata con CF ha mostrato che circa il 65% delle FE sono corrette e utili, il che è sufficientemente elevato considerando l\'uso pratico.', 'lt': "Moksliniuose dokumentuose dažnai naudojamos formuluotės (FE), pavyzdžiui, „šiame dokumente siūlome“. FEs convey a communicative function (CF), i.e. `showing the aim of the paper' in the above-mentioned example.  Nors CF pažymėtos FE padeda moksliniam rašymui, kuriant FE duomenų bazes reikia dirbti rankiniu būdu CF ženklams priskirti. In this study, we considered a fully automated construction of a CF-labelled FE database using the top-down approach, in which the CF labels are first assigned to sentences, and then the FEs are extracted.  For the CF-label assignment, we created a CF-labelled sentence dataset, on which we trained a SciBERT classifier.  We show that the classifier and dataset can be used to construct FE databases of disciplines that are different from the training data.  Drausminės klasifikacijos tikslumas buvo didesnis kaip 80 %, o tarpdisciplininė klasifikacija taip pat gerai veikė. Taip pat siūlome FE gavybos metodą, kuris buvo taikomas CF pažymėtiems sakiniams. Finally, we constructed and published a new, large CF-labelled FE database.  Galutinės CF pažymėtos FE duomenų bazės vertinimas parodė, kad maždaug 65 proc. FE yra teisingos ir naudingos, o tai pakankamai didelė atsižvelgiant į praktinį naudojimą.", 'kk': '"Бұл қағазда, біз таңдап береміз" секілді формулалық өрнектері (FE) ғылыми қағаздарда көбірек қолданылады. FEs жоғардағы мысалында "қағаздың мақсатын көрсету" деген коммуникациялық функциясын (CF) береді. CF жарлығындағы FE академикалық жазуға көмектесетін болса да, FE деректер қорларын құру үшін CF жарлығын қолмен жұмыс істеу керек. Бұл зерттеулерде, Жоғарғы жағдайда CF жарлықтары сөздерге алғашқы сұлбаларға бөліп, FE деректер қорын автоматты түрде құру деп ойладық. CF- жарлық тапсырмасы үшін, SciBERT классификаторын оқыту үшін, CF- жарлық сөз деректер жиынын құрдық. Біз классификациялық және деректер қорлары FE деректер қорларын оқыту деректер қорларынан айырмалы дисциплиналарды құру үшін қолданылады. Дисциплиналық классификациясының дұрыстығы 80%-дан артық, бірақ бірнеше дициплиналық классификациясы да жақсы жұмыс істеді. Сонымен қатар, CF жарлығына қолданылатын FE тарқату әдісін таңдаймыз. Соңында, біз жаңа, үлкен CF- деген FE деректер қорын құрып шығардық. FE деректер қорының соңғы CF белгілеген деректер қорының оқиғасы FE дегеннің 65% дегені дұрыс және пайдалы екенін көрсетті, бұл практикалық пайдалану үшін жеткілікті.', 'mk': "Formulaic expressions (FEs), such as `in this paper, we propose' are frequently used in scientific papers.  ФЕ пренесуваат комуникациска функција (ФФ), т.е. „покажување на целта на хартијата“ во наведениот пример. Иако ФЕ означени со ФФ се корисни за помош во академското пишување, изградбата на базите на податоци на ФЕ бара рачна работа за доделување на етикети на ФФ. In this study, we considered a fully automated construction of a CF-labelled FE database using the top-down approach, in which the CF labels are first assigned to sentences, and then the FEs are extracted.  For the CF-label assignment, we created a CF-labelled sentence dataset, on which we trained a SciBERT classifier.  Ние покажуваме дека класификаторот и податоците може да се користат за изградба на податочни бази на ФЕ на дисциплини кои се различни од податоците за обука. Точноста на во-дисциплинарната класификација беше повеќе од 80 отсто, додека крстодисциплинарната класификација, исто така, функционираше добро. We also propose an FE extraction method, which was applied to the CF-labelled sentences.  Конечно, изградивме и објавивме нова, голема база на податоци на ФЕ означена со ФФ. Проценката на финалната база на податоци на ФЕ означена со ФФ покажа дека околу 65 отсто од ФЕ се точни и корисни, што е доволно високо со оглед на практичната употреба.", 'ms': "Ungkapan formula (FE), seperti `dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan' sering digunakan dalam kertas saintifik. FE menyebarkan fungsi komunikatif (CF), iaitu 'menunjukkan tujuan kertas' dalam contoh yang disebut di atas. Walaupun FE-labeled CF membantu dalam membantu menulis akademik, pembangunan pangkalan data FE memerlukan kerja manual untuk menyerahkan label CF. In this study, we considered a fully automated construction of a CF-labelled FE database using the top-down approach, in which the CF labels are first assigned to sentences, and then the FEs are extracted.  For the CF-label assignment, we created a CF-labelled sentence dataset, on which we trained a SciBERT classifier.  Kami menunjukkan bahawa pengklasifikasi dan set data boleh digunakan untuk membina pangkalan data FE disiplin yang berbeza dari data latihan. Ketepatan klasifikasi dalam-disiplin lebih dari 80%, sementara klasifikasi saling disiplin juga berjaya dengan baik. Kami juga mengusulkan kaedah ekstraksi FE, yang dilaksanakan pada kalimat-labeled CF. Akhirnya, kami membina dan menerbitkan pangkalan data FE yang baru, besar. Pengesahan pangkalan data FE terakhir yang ditabel CF menunjukkan bahawa sekitar 65% FE adalah betul dan berguna, yang cukup tinggi mengingat penggunaan praktik.", 'ml': "ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d 'ഫോര്\u200dമുലിക്ക് പ്രസ്താവിക്കുന്നു' പോലെയുള്ള ഫോര്\u200dമുലിക് പ്രസ്താനങ്ങള്\u200d (FEs), ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥി എഫ്എസ് മുകളിലുള്ള ഉദാഹരണത്തില്\u200d 'പേപ്പറിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം കാണിക്കുന്നു' എന്ന ഒരു കമ്മിക്കോണിവിക്കല്\u200d ഫാങ്ഷന്\u200d അറിയി CF-ലേബെല്\u200dഡ് എഫ്എസ് അക്കാഡിക് എഴുതുന്നതിനെ സഹായിക്കാന്\u200d സഹായിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെങ്കിലും FE ഡാറ്റാബേസുകളുടെ നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതി ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു സിഎഫ് ലേബെയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട FE ഡാറ്റാബേസ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിനെ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും വിചാരിച്ചു. അതില്\u200d സിഎഫ് ലേബിളുകള്\u200d  സിഎഫ്-ലേബറ്റ് ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് നാം സിഎഫ്-ലേബെര്\u200dട്ട് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കറ്റര്\u200d പരിശീലനം ചെയ്തു. നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നത് പരിശീലനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ഡേറ്റാബേസുകള്\u200d FE ഡേറ്റാബേസ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കാ ശിക്ഷാവിധി വ്യവസ്ഥയ്ക്കുള്ള വിശ്വാസം 80% കൂടുതലായിരുന്നു. ക്രിസ്പിശിപ്ലിനിയയുടെ വ്യവസ്ഥയും നല്ല പ്രവര്\u200dത നമ്മളും ഒരു FE പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്ന രീതിയും പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു. അത് സിഎഫ് ലേബെല്\u200dഡ് ചെയ്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200dക അവസാനം, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ സിഎഫ് ലേബെല്\u200dഡ് എഫ് ഡാറ്റാബേസ് ഉണ്ടാക്കി പ്രസിദ്ധീകരിച്ചു. FE ഡാറ്റാബേസിന്റെ അവസാനത്തെ സിഎഫ് ലേബെയില്\u200d പരിഗണിക്കുന്നത് എഫ്എസില്\u200d ഏകദേശം 65% ശരിയാണ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതെന്നും കാണിച്ചു. അത് പ്രാക", 'mt': "Formulaic expressions (FEs), such as `in this paper, we propose' are frequently used in scientific papers.  FEs convey a communicative function (CF), i.e. `showing the aim of the paper' in the above-mentioned example.  Għalkemm FEs ittikkettati b’CF huma ta’ għajnuna biex jgħinu l-kitba akkademika, il-kostruzzjoni ta’ bażijiet tad-dejta tal-FE teħtieġ xogħol manwali għall-assenjazzjoni ta’ tikketti tas-CF. F’dan l-istudju, ikkunsidrajna kostruzzjoni kompletament awtomatizzata ta’ bażi tad-dejta tal-FE bit-tikketta CF bl-użu tal-approċċ minn fuq għal isfel, li fih it-tikketti tas-CF għall-ewwel darba jiġu assenjati għas-sentenzi, u mbagħad jiġu estratti l-FEs. For the CF-label assignment, we created a CF-labelled sentence dataset, on which we trained a SciBERT classifier.  Aħna nuru li l-klassifikatur u s-sett tad-dejta jistgħu jintużaw biex jinbnew bażijiet tad-dejta tal-FE ta’ dixxiplini li huma differenti mid-dejta tat-taħriġ. Il-preċiżjoni tal-klassifikazzjoni in-dixxiplinarja kienet aktar minn 80%, filwaqt li l-klassifikazzjoni transdixxiplinarja ħadmet tajjeb ukoll. We also propose an FE extraction method, which was applied to the CF-labelled sentences.  Fl-a ħħar nett, inbnejna u ppubblikajna bażi tad-dejta ġdida u kbira tal-FE bit-tikketta tas-CF. L-evalwazzjoni tad-database finali tal-FE bit-tikketta tas-CF uriet li madwar 65% tal-FEs huma korretti u utli, li huwa għoli biżżejjed meta jitqies l-użu prattiku.", 'mn': 'Шинжлэх ухааны сониндоо ихэвчлэн хэрэглэгддэг хэлбэрүүдийн илэрхийллүүд (FES) юм. FEs нь дээр дурсан жишээнд харилцааны зорилго (CF) гэдэг. Хэдийгээр CF-т нэрлэгдсэн FE нь академикийн бичилгээ туслахад тусалдаг ч, FE өгөгдлийн санг бүтээхэд CF-ийн etiketүүдийг тайлбарлахын тулд гарын ажил хэрэгтэй. Энэ судалгаанд бид CF-тэй нэрлэгдсэн FE өгөгдлийн сан дээд доорх аргыг ашиглан автоматжуулсан байгууллага гэж бодсон. Энэ нь CF-ийн etiketүүд эхлээд өгөгдлийг өгүүлбэрт тавьж, дараа нь FE-г гаргасан. CF-н жагсаалтын даалгаврын тулд бид CF-н жагсаалт өгөгдлийн санг бүтээсэн. Үүний тулд SciBERT классификаторыг суралцсан. Бид хэлэлцээгч болон өгөгдлийн санг сургалтын өгөгдлийн мэдээллээс өөр өөр хэлбэртэй FE өгөгдлийн санг бүтээхэд ашиглаж болно гэдгийг харуулж байна. Шинжлэх ухааны тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолт нь 80%-аас илүү байсан, мөн олон дисциплинаар хуваалцах нь ч сайн ажилладаг. Мөн бид CF-тэй тэмдэглэгдсэн үгийг ашиглан FE гаргах аргыг санал болгож байна. Эцэст нь бид шинэ, том, CF-тэй FE өгөгдлийн сан бүтээсэн. Сүүлийн CF-тэй нэрлэгдсэн FE өгөгдлийн сангийн оюун шалгалт нь FE-ын ойролцоогоор 65% нь зөв болон ашигтай гэдгийг харуулсан. Энэ нь практикийн хэрэглээнд хангалттай өндөр байдаг.', 'no': 'Formuliske uttrykk (FEs), som «i papiret, fører vi» ofte brukast i vitenskapelige papir. FEs flyttar e in kommunikasjonsfunksjon (CF), t.d. « viser målet på papiret » i eksemplet over. Selv om FE-merkelappen er nyttig for å hjelpa med akademisk skriving, krev at FE-databaser bygger manuelt arbeid for å tilgjera CF-merkelappen. I denne studien ser vi ut til ein fullstendig automatisk konstruksjon av ein FE-databasen med merkelappen CF ved hjelp av tilnærminga øvst ned, der CF-merkelappene først er tildelte til setningar, og deretter vert FE ekstraherte. For tillegget til CF- merkelappen oppretta vi ei setningsdata med CF- merkelappen, der vi trenga ein SciBERT- klassifisering. Vi viser at klassifiseringen og datasettet kan brukast for å konstruere FE-databaser av discipliner som er ulike frå opplæringsdata. Den nøyaktigheten til i disciplinar klassifikasjon var mer enn 80 %, mens krysdisciplinar klassifikasjon også fungerte godt. Vi foreslår også ein FE-utpakkingsmetode, som vart brukt til CF-merket setningar. I slutt, vi konstruerte og publiserte ein ny, stor, CF- merket FE- database. Evalueringa av den siste FE-databasen med CF-merket viste at omtrent 65 % av FE-ane er rett og nyttig, som er nok høg i bruk av praktiske bruk.', 'pl': 'Wyrażenia formułowe (FE), takie jak "w niniejszym artykule proponujemy", są często stosowane w pracach naukowych. FEs przekazują funkcję komunikacyjną (CF), tj. "pokazanie celu pracy" w wyżej wymienionym przykładzie. Chociaż FEs oznakowane CF są pomocne w pisaniu akademickim, budowa baz danych FE wymaga pracy ręcznej przy przypisywaniu etykiet CF. W niniejszym opracowaniu rozważaliśmy w pełni zautomatyzowaną konstrukcję bazy danych FE oznakowanej CF przy użyciu podejścia odgórnego, w której etykiety CF są najpierw przypisywane do zdań, a następnie wyodrębniane są FE. Do przypisania etykiety CF stworzyliśmy zbiór danych zdań znakowanych CF, na którym przeszkololiśmy klasyfikator SciBERT. Pokazujemy, że klasyfikator i zestaw danych można wykorzystać do budowy baz danych FE dyscyplin, które różnią się od danych treningowych. Dokładność klasyfikacji interdyscyplinarnej wynosiła ponad 80%, a klasyfikacja interdyscyplinarna również sprawdziła się dobrze. Proponujemy również metodę ekstrakcji FE, która została zastosowana do zdań oznakowanych CF. Wreszcie zbudowaliśmy i opublikowaliśmy nową, dużą bazę danych FE oznakowaną CF. Ocena ostatecznej bazy danych FE oznakowanej CF wykazała, że około 65% FE są poprawne i użyteczne, co jest wystarczająco wysokie biorąc pod uwagę praktyczne zastosowanie.', 'sr': 'Formule izraze (FE), poput "u ovom papiru, predlažemo", često se koriste u naučnim novinama. FEs predstavlja komunikacijsku funkciju (CF), tj. „pokazuje cilj papira“ u iznad spomenutog primjera. Iako su CF-etiketirani FE korisni u pomaganju akademijskom pisanju, izgradnja baze podataka FE zahteva ručni rad za dodavanje etiketa CF. U ovom istraživanju, razmišljali smo o potpuno automatskoj izgradnji baze podataka s označenom CF-om FE koristeći vrhunski pristup, u kojem su etikete CF prvi put dodeljene rečenicama, a onda su FE izvadile. Za zadatak CF-etikete, stvorili smo komplet podataka rečenica označenog CF-a, na kojem smo obučili klasifikatora SciBERT-a. Pokazujemo da se klasifikator i seta podataka mogu koristiti za izgradnju baze FE podataka disciplina koje su različite od podataka obuke. Točnost u disciplinarnoj klasifikaciji bila je više od 80%, dok je i krstodisciplinarna klasifikacija dobro radila. Takođe predlažemo metodu ekstrakcije FE, koja je primjenjena na rečenice označene na CF-u. Konačno smo izgradili i objavili novu, veliku bazu podataka s označenom CF-om FE. Procjena konačne baze podataka s označenom CF-om FE pokazala je da su približno 65% FE ispravne i korisne, što je dovoljno visoko s obzirom na praktičnu upotrebu.', 'ro': 'Expresiile formula (FE), cum ar fi `în această lucrare, propunem\' sunt folosite frecvent în lucrările științifice. FI transmit o funcție comunicativă (CF), adică "arătând scopul lucrării" în exemplul menționat mai sus. Deși FE marcate cu CF sunt utile în sprijinirea scrierii academice, construirea bazelor de date FE necesită muncă manuală pentru atribuirea etichetelor CF. În acest studiu, am luat în considerare o construcție complet automatizată a unei baze de date FE etichetate CF utilizând abordarea sus-în jos, în care etichetele CF sunt atribuite mai întâi propozițiilor, iar apoi sunt extrase FE. Pentru atribuirea etichetei CF, am creat un set de date de fraze marcat CF, pe care am instruit un clasificator SciBERT. Aratăm că clasificatorul și setul de date pot fi utilizate pentru a construi baze de date FE de discipline care sunt diferite de datele de formare. Precizia clasificării interdisciplinare a fost de peste 80%, în timp ce clasificarea interdisciplinară a funcționat bine. De asemenea, propunem o metodă de extracție FE, care a fost aplicată frazelor marcate cu CF. În cele din urmă, am construit și publicat o nouă bază de date FE cu etichetare CF. Evaluarea bazei de date finale FE marcate cu CF a arătat că aproximativ 65% dintre FE sunt corecte și utile, ceea ce este suficient de ridicat având în vedere utilizarea practică.', 'si': "සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස (FEs) වගේ, `මේ පිතුරේ, අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා' විද්\u200dයාත්මක පිතුරු වලින් භාවිත කරනවා. FEs සම්බන්ධ ව්\u200dයාපෘතියක් (CF), ඉතින් 'පත්තරේ අලක්ෂාවක් පෙන්වන්න' කිරීමේ උදාහරණයෙන්. CF-ලේබල් කරලා තියෙන්නේ FEs විද්\u200dයාවික ලේබල් එක සහාය කරන්න උදව් කරන්න, FE දත්ත බේස් නිර්මාණය සඳහා CF ලේබල් සැලසුම් කරන්න පු මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, අපි හිතන්නේ CF-ලේබල් කරපු FE ඩේටාබේස් එකේ සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විදිහට ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විදිහට සිද්ධ වුන CF- ලේබල් සැකසුම් වෙනුවෙන්, අපි CF- ලේබල් කරපු වාක්ය දත්ත සූදානයක් නිර්මාණය කළා, ඒ වගේම අපි SciBERT ක්\u200dරියා අපි පෙන්වන්නේ විශේෂකය සහ දත්ත සෙට් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් FE දත්ත බේස් නිර්මාණය කරගන්න පුළුවන් කිය ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්වාසික විශ්වාසික විශ්වාසික විශ්වාසික විශ්වාසික විශ්වාසික විශ්වාසික විශ්ව අපි සමහරවිට FE නිර්මාණය විධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒක CF-ලේබල් විධානයට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. අන්තිමට, අපි නිර්මාණය කරලා අළුත්, ලොකු CF ලේබල් කරපු FE ඩේටාබේස් එකක් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරලා. අන්තිම CF-ලේබල් කරපු FE ඩේටාබේස් එකේ අවශ්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට FE ගැන 65% හරි සහ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයි, ඒක", 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaa inta badan lagu isticmaalaa warqadaha cilmiga leh. FEs wuxuu tusaale ahaan u muujiyaa waxyaabaha la xiriira (CF). In kastoo FEs la magacaabay ay caawimaad u tahay in ay caawiyaan qoraalka akademiga ah, dhisidda shabakada FE waxay u baahan tahay shaqada manual ah si ay u qaybsato alaabta CF. Waxbarashadan ayaannu ka fiirsannay dhismo kamid ah oo lagu magacaabay CF-ka oo lagu isticmaalayo habka hoose-hoose, kaas oo ugu horraysa alaabta CF looga qaybiyey cibaado, kadibna waxaa la soo saaray FEs. Qaybta CF-label, waxan u abuurnay koob macluumaad ah oo lagu magacaabay CF, taasoo aan ku tababarinnay SciBERT fasax. Waxaynu tusnaynaa in fasax-fasax iyo taariikhda waxaa loo isticmaali karaa in la dhiso aasaaska FE ee waxbarashada oo ka duwan macluumaadka waxbarashada. Takhasuska fasaxda waxbarashada waxay ahayd in ka badan 80 boqolkiiba, sidoo kale fasaxa iskuulka iskuulka ah ayaa si wanaagsan u shaqeeyey. Waxaynu sidoo kale soo jeedaynaa qaab ka soo bixinta FE, kaas oo lagu codsaday xarumaha CF-da. Ugu dambaysta, waxaynu dhisnay oo baasaynnay basaaska FE ee cusub oo lagu magacaabay CF. Qiimeynta aasaaska FE ee ugu dambeeyay ee CF-ka lagu magacaabay wuxuu muujiyey in qiyaastii 65% ka mid ah FEs ay sax yihiin oo faa’iido leh, taas oo aad ugu filan ka fikiraya isticmaalka caadiga ah.', 'sv': 'Formella uttryck (FE), som `i denna uppsats föreslår vi\' används ofta i vetenskapliga artiklar. FI förmedlar en kommunikativ funktion (CF), dvs. "visa uppsatsens syfte" i ovanstående exempel. Även om CF-märkta FE är till hjälp för akademiskt skrivande kräver byggandet av FE-databaser manuellt arbete för att tilldela CF-etiketter. I denna studie övervägde vi en helautomatisk konstruktion av en CF-märkt FE-databas med hjälp av uppifrån och ner-metoden, där CF-etiketterna först tilldelas meningar och sedan extraheras FE. För CF-märkningsuppdraget skapade vi en CF-märkt meningsdata, där vi utbildade en SciBERT-klassificerare. Vi visar att klassificeraren och datauppsättningen kan användas för att bygga FE databaser över discipliner som skiljer sig från utbildningsdata. Noggrannheten i den disciplinära klassificeringen var mer än 80%, medan den tvärvetenskapliga klassificeringen också fungerade bra. Vi föreslår också en FE extraktionsmetod, som tillämpades på CF-märkta meningar. Slutligen konstruerade och publicerade vi en ny, stor CF-märkt FE databas. Utvärderingen av den slutliga CF-märkta FE-databasen visade att cirka 65% av FE är korrekta och användbara, vilket är tillräckligt hög med tanke på praktisk användning.', 'ta': "'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம்' போன்ற வடிவமைப்பு கூறுகள் அறிவியல் தாள்களில் பெரும்பாலாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட FEs தொடர்பு செயல்பாடு (CF), அதாவது 'காகிதத்தின் இலக்கு' மேல் குறிப்பிட்ட உதாரணத்தில் காட்டுகிறது. CF- அடையாளப்பட்ட FEs கலாசிரியல் எழுதுதலை உதவியாக இருந்தாலும், FE தரவுத்தளத்தின் உருவாக்கம் CF சிட்டைகளை ஒதுக்க கைமுறை செயல் தேவைப்பட இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், நாங்கள் முழுவதும் தானாக தானியங்கி சிஎஃப் குறிப்பிட்ட FE தரவுத்தளத்தின் உருவாக்கத்தை கருதினோம், அதில் CF குறிகள் முதலில் வாக CF- விளக்கச்சீட்டு பணிப்புக்கு, நாம் சிஎஃப்- சிஎஃப் சிட்டியிடப்பட்ட வாக்கிய தகவல் அமைப்பை உருவாக்கி, அதில் நாம் ஒரு ஸ்க நாம் வகுப்பாளர் மற்றும் தரவு அமைப்பு பயிற்சி தரவுத்தளங்களை உருவாக்க பயன்படுத்தலாம் என்பதை காட்டுகிறோம். வகுப்பின் சரியான மதிப்பு நாம் ஒரு FE வெளியீட்டு முறைமையையும் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், அது CF-குறிப்பிட்ட வாக்குகளுக்கு பயன்படுத் இறுதியில், நாங்கள் ஒரு புதிய CF-குறிப்பிட்ட FE தரவுத்தளத்தை உருவாக்கி வெளியிட்டோம். கடைசி CF-அடையாளம் குறிப்பிட்ட FE தரவுத்தளத்தின் மதிப்பினை காண்பித்துள்ளார்கள் குறைந்த 65% FEs சரியாகவும் பயனுள்ளதாகவும், அது செயல்பாட", 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں "ہم پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں" کی فرمولی مثالیں (FES) ہیں، جیسے "اس کاغذ میں، ہم پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں" اغلب علم کاغذوں میں استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں. FEs ایک ارتباط فعالیت (CF) پہنچاتا ہے، یعنی „کاغذ کا موقع دکھاتا ہے” اس مثال میں۔ Although CF-labeled FES are helpful in assisting academic writing, the construction of FE databases requires manual labour for assigning CF labels. اس مطالعہ میں ہم نے ایک CF-لیبل FE ڈیٹابیس کا کامل طور پر اپنا بنانا سمجھا تھا جہاں CF لیبل پہلے کلمات کے لئے مقرر کیے جاتے ہیں اور پھر FES اٹھائے جاتے ہیں. ہم نے CF-لیبل واحد کے لئے ایک CF-لیبل واحد ڈاٹ سٹ پیدا کیا ہے جس پر ہم نے ایک SciBERT کلاسیر کی تعلیم دی ہے. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ کلاسفار اور ڈیٹ سٹ کو فس ڈیٹ بیس بنانے کے لئے استعمال کر سکتے ہیں جو ٹرینگ ڈیٹ سے مختلف ہیں۔ صحیح صحیح تقسیم کے مطابق 80% سے زیادہ تھا، حالانکہ cross-disciplinary classification بھی اچھا کام کیا گیا تھا. ہم نے بھی ایک FE اٹھانے کا طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتا ہے، جو CF لکھی ہوئی جماعت پر لازم کیا گیا تھا۔ آخر میں ہم نے ایک نوی، بڑی CF-لابل ڈیٹابیس بنائی اور پیغام دی۔ آخری CF لیبل ڈیٹابیس کی ارزیابی نے دکھائی کہ تقریباً 65 فیس کے درصد درست اور فائدہ ہیں، جو کامل استعمال کے بارے میں کافی بالا ہے۔', 'uz': 'Formulak ifodalar (FEs), bu qogʻozdagi "bu qogʻozdagi" kabi, biz rivojlanamiz, ko\'pincha ilmiy takarda foydalaniladi. FEs yuqori misol bilan "qogʻozning maqsadini koʻrsatish" degan aloqa funksiyasini brauzadi. Agar CF tuzilgan FEs akademik yozishga yordam beradi, FE maʼlumotlar bazasini yaratish uchun qoʻlbola ishlash kerak. Bu taʼminotda, biz yuqori quyidagi FE maʼlumotlar bazasini ishlatish mumkin. Bu yerda CF tugmalari birinchi maxfiy soʻzga qaytarilgan va keyin FS tugmalar birikmasini olib tashlanadi. CF yorliq tashkilotlari uchun biz CF notoʻgʻri maxfiy soʻzni yaratdik. Bu yerda biz SciBERT klassifikini o\'rganish mumkin. Biz taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar bazasini ishlab chiqarish mumkin. Taʼlim darajasining aniqligi 80% dan ortiq edi, va har xil taʼminlik darajasi ham yaxshi ishlaydi. We also propose an FE extraction method, which was applied to the CF-labelled sentences.  Oxirgi, biz yangi, katta CF notoʻgʻri FE maʼlumot bazasini yaratdik. Oxirgi CF notoʻgʻri FE maʼlumot bazasining qiymati FEs asosida 65% toʻgʻri va ishlatilganligini koʻrsatish mumkin. Bu foydalanish juda juda qulay.', 'vi': 'Những biểu hiện theo dạng như "trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị" thường được dùng trong các tác phẩm khoa học. Đội liên lạc vận chuyển chức năng liên lạc (CF), tức là\'hiển thị mục tiêu của tờ báo\'trong ví dụ trên. Mặc dù các liên lạc có nhãn đặc đủ để hỗ trợ việc viết thư học, nhưng việc xây dựng cơ sở dữ liệu E cần phải có công nhân để bố các nhãn hiệu CF. Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi đã cân nhắc việc xây dựng một cơ sở dữ liệu có gắn kết gen, dùng phương pháp trên cùng, để các nhãn qua đường dẫn đến các câu trước, sau đó các con robot được trích ra. Chúng tôi đã tạo ra một tập tin từ các bản ghi,...được đào tạo bởi một chuyên gia phân loại SciBERT. Chúng tôi cho thấy người phân loại và bộ dữ liệu có thể được dùng để xây dựng cơ sở dữ liệu đắp đắp đắp đắp đắp đắp đắp đắp đắp. khác với dữ liệu đào tạo. Sự chính xác của mức độ phân loại trong kỷ luật hơn 80 Xu, còn tỉ lệ phân loại khác nhau hiệu quả. Chúng tôi cũng đề nghị một phương pháp chiết xuất EC, được áp dụng cho các câu có bìa. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi đã xây dựng và công bố một cơ sở dữ liệu lớn. Bài đánh giá của cơ sở dữ liệu FF được dán nhãn cuối cùng cho thấy khoảng cách 85+ của thực tế là chính xác và bổ ích, đủ cao để cân nhắc việc sử dụng thực tế.', 'hr': 'Formule izraze (FE), poput "u ovom papiru, predlažemo", često se koriste u znanstvenim papirima. FEs predstavlja komunikacijsku funkciju (CF), tj. „pokazuje cilj papira“ u iznad spomenutog primjera. Iako su FE-ovi označeni na CF-u korisni za pomoć akademičkog pisanja, izgradnja baze podataka FE-a zahtijeva ručni rad za dodavanje etiketa CF-a. U ovom ispitivanju, smatrali smo potpuno automatskom izgradnji baze podataka s označenom CF-om FE koristeći vrhunski pristup, u kojem su etikete CF prvi put dodijeljene kaznama, a onda su FE izvučene. Za zadatak CF-etikete, stvorili smo komplet podataka označenog CF-a, na kojem smo obučili klasifikator SciBERT-a. Pokazujemo da se klasifikator i seta podataka mogu koristiti za izgradnju baze podataka FE disciplina koje su različite od podataka obuke. Točnost u disciplinarnoj klasifikaciji bila je više od 80%, dok je i krstodisciplinarna klasifikacija dobro funkcionirala. Također predlažemo metodu ekstrakcije FE, koja je primjenjena na rečenice označene na CF-u. Konačno smo izgradili i objavili novu, veliku bazu podataka s označenom CF-om FE. Procjena konačne baze podataka s označenom CF-om FE pokazala je da su približno 65% FE ispravne i korisne, što je dovoljno visoko s obzirom na praktičnu primjenu.', 'bg': 'Формулаторни изрази (ФЕ), като "в тази статия предлагаме", често се използват в научни статии. Фе предават комуникативна функция (КФ), т.е. "показване на целта на доклада" в горепосочения пример. Въпреки че маркираните ФЕ са полезни за подпомагане на академичното писане, изграждането на бази данни на ФЕ изисква ръчен труд за присъждане на етикети ФЕ. В това проучване разгледахме напълно автоматизирано изграждане на база данни с етикет ФЕ, използвайки подхода отгоре надолу, при който етикетите на ФЕ първо се присвояват на изречения, а след това се извличат ФЕ. За задаването на етикета създадохме набор от данни от изречения с етикет, върху който обучихме класификатор. Показваме, че класификаторът и наборът от данни могат да се използват за изграждане на бази данни от дисциплини, които са различни от данните за обучение. Точността на дисциплинарната класификация е над 80%, а междудисциплинарната класификация също работи добре. Предлагаме и метод за екстракция на ФЕ, който беше приложен към изреченията, обозначени с CF. Накрая изградихме и публикувахме нова, голяма база данни с етикет ФЕ. Оценката на окончателната база данни за FE, обозначена с CF, показа, че приблизително 65% от ФЕ са правилни и полезни, което е достатъчно високо предвид практическата употреба.', 'nl': "Formulaïsche uitdrukkingen (FE's), zoals 'in deze paper stellen we voor' worden vaak gebruikt in wetenschappelijke artikelen. FEs geven een communicatieve functie (CF) over, d.w.z. 'het doel van de paper tonen' in het bovengenoemde voorbeeld. Hoewel CF-gelabelde FE's nuttig zijn bij het helpen van academisch schrijven, vereist de bouw van FE-databases handmatige arbeid voor het toekennen van CF-labels. In dit onderzoek hebben we overwogen een volledig geautomatiseerde constructie van een CF-gelabelde FE database met de top-down benadering, waarbij de CF labels eerst aan zinnen worden toegewezen en vervolgens de FE's worden geëxtraheerd. Voor de CF-label toewijzing hebben we een CF-gelabelde zin dataset gemaakt, waarop we een SciBERT classificator hebben getraind. We laten zien dat de classificator en dataset gebruikt kunnen worden om FE databases op te bouwen van disciplines die afwijken van de trainingsgegevens. De nauwkeurigheid van de interdisciplinaire classificatie was meer dan 80%, terwijl de interdisciplinaire classificatie ook goed werkte. We stellen ook een FE extractiemethode voor, die werd toegepast op de CF-gelabelde zinnen. Tot slot hebben we een nieuwe, grote CF-gelabelde FE database opgebouwd en gepubliceerd. Uit de evaluatie van de definitieve CF-gelabelde FE-databank bleek dat ongeveer 65% van de FE's correct en nuttig zijn, wat gezien het praktische gebruik voldoende hoog is.", 'da': 'Formulære udtryk (FE\'er), såsom `i denne artikel foreslår vi\', bruges ofte i videnskabelige artikler. F\'er formidler en kommunikativ funktion (CF), dvs. "viser formålet med artiklen" i ovennævnte eksempel. Selvom CF-mærkede FE\'er er nyttige til at hjælpe akademisk skrivning, kræver opbygningen af FE-databaser manuel arbejdskraft til at tildele CF-mærker. I denne undersøgelse overvejede vi en fuldautomatisk konstruktion af en CF-mærket FE database ved hjælp af top-down metoden, hvor CF-etiketterne først tildeles sætninger, og derefter udtrækkes FE\'erne. Til CF-label-opgaven oprettede vi et CF-mærket sætningsdatasyt, hvor vi trænede en SciBERT-klassificering. Vi viser, at klassificeringen og datasættet kan bruges til at konstruere FE databaser over discipliner, der er forskellige fra træningsdata. Nøjagtigheden af den disciplinære klassificering var mere end 80%, mens den tværfaglige klassificering også fungerede godt. Vi foreslår også en FE ekstraktionsmetode, som blev anvendt på CF-mærkede sætninger. Endelig konstruerede og offentliggjorde vi en ny, stor CF-mærket FE database. Evalueringen af den endelige CF-mærkede FE-database viste, at ca. 65% af FE\'erne er korrekte og nyttige, hvilket er tilstrækkeligt højt i betragtning af praktisk anvendelse.', 'ko': "'본문에서 우리는 제안한다'는 식의 표현(FES)은 과학 논문에서 자주 사용된다.FES는 상기 예시에서'논문을 보여주는 목적'이라는 교제기능(CF)을 전달했다.CF 레이블의 FES는 학술 집필에 도움이 되지만, FE 데이터베이스 구축에는 CF 레이블을 수동으로 할당해야 한다.본 연구에서 우리는 CF 표지의 FE 데이터베이스를 완전히 자동적으로 구축하는 방법을 고려했다. 그 중에서 CF 표지는 문장에 먼저 분배된 다음에 FE를 추출하는 것을 고려했다.CF 태그 할당에 대해 CF 태그 문장 데이터 세트를 만들고 이 데이터 세트에 SciBERT 분류기를 훈련했습니다.우리는 분류기와 데이터 집합이 훈련 데이터와 다른 학과 FE 데이터베이스를 구축할 수 있음을 증명했다.학과 내 분류의 정확도는 80%를 넘고 학과별 분류도 효과적이다.FE 추출 방법을 제시하여 CF 표기된 문장에 적용했습니다.마지막으로 우리는 새로운 대형 CF 태그 FE 데이터베이스를 구축하고 발표했다.최종 CF가 표시한 철 데이터베이스에 대한 평가에 따르면 철의 약 65%가 정확하고 유용하며 실제 사용을 감안하면 충분하다.", 'id': "Ekspresi formulir (FE), seperti `dalam kertas ini, kami menyarankan' sering digunakan dalam kertas ilmiah. FE menyampaikan fungsi komunikatif (CF), i.e. 'menunjukkan tujuan kertas' dalam contoh yang disebutkan di atas. Meskipun FE-label CF membantu dalam membantu menulis akademis, pembangunan databases FE membutuhkan pekerjaan manual untuk mengatur label CF. Dalam penelitian ini, kami mempertimbangkan konstruksi yang sepenuhnya otomatis dari database FE berlabel CF menggunakan pendekatan dari atas ke bawah, di mana label CF pertama ditugaskan untuk kalimat, dan kemudian FE-nya diekstraksi. Untuk tugas label CF, kami menciptakan dataset kalimat labeled CF, di mana kami melatih klassifikasi SciBERT. Kami menunjukkan bahwa klasifikasi dan dataset dapat digunakan untuk membangun databases FE disiplin yang berbeda dari data latihan. Akurat klasifikasi dalam disiplin lebih dari 80%, sementara klasifikasi cross-disiplin juga bekerja dengan baik. Kami juga mengusulkan metode ekstraksi FE, yang diterapkan pada kalimat-labeled CF. Akhirnya, kami membangun dan mempublikasikan database FE yang baru, besar dengan label CF. Evaluasi database FE terakhir yang ditabel CF menunjukkan bahwa sekitar 65% FE benar dan berguna, yang cukup tinggi mengingat penggunaan praktis.", 'tr': '"Bu kagyzda, biziň teklipimiz" ýaly formülik ifadeler (FEs), bilim kagyzlarda köplenç ulanylýar. FEs üýtgeşik funksiýasyny (CF), i ň.görnüşdeki ýagdaýda "kagyzyň maksadyny görkez". FE etiketli FE akademiki ýazmaga kömek etmek üçin faydaly bolsa-da, FE veritabanlarynyň düzenlemesi CF etiketleri taýýarlamak üçin el işi gerek. Bu araşdyrmada FE diýilip hasaplanýan CF databank hasaplanyşynyň üst a şagy golaýyny ulanyp doly otomatik hasaplanýardyk we ol ýerde CF etiketleri sözlere berildi we soňra FE-ler çekilýärler. CF etiketli zady üçin, bir CF etiket edilen sözlem datasetini bejerdik we bir SciBERT klasifikatyny bejerdik. Biz klasifikatçy we veri setirini FE databaselerini eğitim maglumatyndan farklı düzenlemek üçin ullanabileris Taýpliniň derejesi 80%-den köp, çarp-disipliniň klasifikasy hem gowy işledi. Biz hem FE\'i açma yöntemini teklip edip görýäris. Bu CF etilgeli sözlere uygulandy. Soňunda biz Täze, Ullakan CF hasaplanýan FE databasesini inşa etdik we publikatdyk. FE etiket edilen soňky CF dataýasynyň deňlenmesi FE sanynyň 65% dogry we ýüzedir diýip kabul edilen ýagdaýyny görkezildi.', 'fa': 'واژه\u200cهای فرمولی (FEs) مثل «در این کاغذ، پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم» اغلب در کاغذهای علمی استفاده می\u200cشوند. FEs یک عملکرد ارتباطی (CF) را در مثال بالا می\u200cدهد، یعنی «هدف کاغذ» را نشان می\u200cدهد. اگرچه FE با علامت CF به نوشتن علمی کمک می\u200cکنند، ساختن داده\u200cهای FE نیاز به کار دستی برای تعیین برچسب CF است. در این مطالعه، ما به طور کامل یک ساختار داده\u200cهای اطلاعات FE با نام CF با استفاده از طریق بالا پایین، که نقاشی CF برای اولین بار به جمله تعیین می\u200cشوند، و سپس FE اخراج می\u200cشوند. برای کاربرد CF-label، ما یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای مجموعه\u200cای با علامت CF ایجاد کردیم که در آن یک مجموعه\u200cگر SciBERT را آموزش دادیم. ما نشان می\u200cدهیم که مجموعه\u200cی محرمانه و داده\u200cها می\u200cتوانند برای ساختن داده\u200cهای FE از دسته\u200cها که متفاوت از داده\u200cهای آموزش هستند استفاده می\u200cشوند. دقیقات کلیسازی غیر نظامی بیشتر از 80 درصد بود، در حالی که کلیسازی غیر نظامی هم خوب کار می کرد. ما همچنین یک روش استخراج FE را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که به جمله\u200cهای CF نامیده می\u200cشود. بالاخره، ما ساختیم و منتشر کردیم یک داده\u200cهای اطلاعات جدید و بزرگ CF با etiket FE. ارزیابی پایان داده\u200cهای اطلاعات FE با etiquette CF نشان داد که تقریباً 65 درصد FE درست و مفید هستند، که به اندازه کافی بالا در مورد استفاده عملی است.', 'de': 'Formelle Ausdrücke (FEs), wie z.B. ‚In diesem Papier schlagen wir vor\', werden häufig in wissenschaftlichen Arbeiten verwendet. FEs vermitteln eine kommunikative Funktion (CF), d.h. "das Ziel der Arbeit zeigen" im oben genannten Beispiel. Obwohl CF-markierte FEs hilfreich sind, um akademisches Schreiben zu unterstützen, erfordert der Aufbau von FE-Datenbanken manuelle Arbeit für die Zuweisung von CF-Labels. In dieser Studie haben wir eine vollautomatische Konstruktion einer CF-markierten FE-Datenbank mit dem Top-Down-Ansatz betrachtet, bei dem die CF-Labels zuerst Sätzen zugeordnet und dann die FE extrahiert werden. Für die CF-Label Zuordnung haben wir einen CF-markierten Satz Datensatz erstellt, auf dem wir einen SciBERT Klassifikator trainieren. Wir zeigen, dass der Klassifikator und Datensatz verwendet werden können, um FE-Datenbanken von Disziplinen zu erstellen, die sich von den Trainingsdaten unterscheiden. Die Genauigkeit der disziplinären Klassifizierung betrug mehr als 80%, während auch die disziplinübergreifende Klassifizierung gut funktionierte. Wir schlagen auch eine FE-Extraktionsmethode vor, die auf die CF-markierten Sätze angewendet wurde. Schließlich haben wir eine neue, große CF-gekennzeichnete FE-Datenbank erstellt und veröffentlicht. Die Auswertung der endgültigen CF-markierten FE-Datenbank ergab, dass etwa 65% der FE korrekt und nützlich sind, was angesichts der praktischen Anwendung ausreichend hoch ist.', 'af': 'Formule uitdrukkings (FEs), soos "in hierdie papier, ons voorstel" word dikwels gebruik in wetenskaplike papier. FEs verskyn \'n kommunikasief funksie (CF), t.d. `vertoon die doel van die papier\' in die bo-mentioneerde voorbeeld. Alhoewel CF-etiketeerde FEs is nuttig in die assistent van akademiese skryfing, die konstruksie van FE databasis benodig handwerk vir toewysing van CF etikette. In hierdie studie, ons het \'n volledig outomatiese konstruksie van \'n CF-etiketeerde FE-databasis aangesien met die bo-af toegang, waarin die CF-etikette eerste aan setinge toegelê is, en dan word die FE uitgevoer. Vir die CF- etiket toewysing, skep ons \'n CF- etiketeerde setdatumset, waarop ons \'n SciBERT klassifiseerder opgelei het. Ons wys dat die klassifiseerder en datastel gebruik kan word om FE databasis van dissipels te konstrukteer wat verskillend is van die onderwerp data. Die presies van in-disciplinary klasifikasie was meer as 80%, terwyl kruisdisciplinary klasifikasie ook goed werk. Ons voorstel ook \'n FE uittrekkingsmetode wat aan die CF-etiketeerde setinge aangepas is. Eindelik het ons \'n nuwe, groot CF-etiketeerde FE-databasis gebou en gepubliseer. Die evaluering van die eindelike CF-etiketeerde FE-databasis het vertoon dat omtrent 65% van die FEs reg en nuttig is, wat is genoeg hoë aanneem praktiese gebruik.', 'sw': "Formulaic expressions (FEs), such as `in this paper, we propose' are frequently used in scientific papers.  FEs convey a communicative function (CF), i.e. `showing the aim of the paper' in the above-mentioned example.  Ingawa FEs yenye maarufu ya CF inasaidia kusaidia kuandika kitaaluma, ujenzi wa databases za FE unahitaji kufanya kazi kwa manufaa kwa kutumia alama za CF. Katika utafiti huu, tulifikiria ujenzi wa taarifa za FE yenye maarufu wa CF kwa kutumia mbinu za juu za chini, ambazo alama za CF zinawekwa kwanza kwenye hukumu, na kisha FEs ziliondolewa. Kwa jukumu la jumbe la CF, tulitengeneza seti ya taarifa za sentenca inayoitwa CF, ambazo tulimfundisha mfanyakazi wa SciBERT. Tunaonyesha kuwa idadi na seti ya taarifa inaweza kutumika kwa ajili ya kutengeneza databases za FE za maafisa ambao ni tofauti na taarifa za mafunzo. Usahihi wa kutafsiri kwa unyanyasaji ulikuwa zaidi ya asilimia 80, wakati utaratibu wa maasi uliofanywa pia ulifanya kazi vizuri. Pia tunapendekeza mbinu ya utekelezaji wa FE, ambayo ilitumiwa kwenye hukumu za CF zilizotajwa. Mwisho, tulijenga na kuchapisha database mpya yenye utambulisho mkubwa wa CF. Tathmini ya database ya mwisho inayoitwa CF ilionyesha kwamba takriban asilimia 65 ya FEs ni sahihi na yenye manufaa, ambayo inatosha kufikiria matumizi ya kihalisi.", 'hy': "Formulaic expressions (FEs), such as `in this paper, we propose' are frequently used in scientific papers.  ՖԵ-ները հաղորդակցման ֆունկցիա են ներկայացնում, այսինքն` թղթի նպատակը ցույց տալիս, վերևում նշված օրինակում: Չնայած, որ ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք համարում էինք ամբողջովին ավտոմատիկ կառուցվածք ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական տվյալների բազայի, որը օգտագործում է վերևի ներքև մոտեցումը, որտեղ ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական տվյալները առաջին անգամ դասությունների վրա են վերա ՔԱ-պիտակ վերագրելու համար մենք ստեղծեցինք ՔԱ-պիտակ նշաններով նշանների տվյալներ, որոնց վրա մենք պատրաստեցինք գիտական դասակարգիչ: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ դասակարգիչը և տվյալների համակարգը կարող են օգտագործվել ՖԵ տվյալների հիմքերի կառուցման համար, որոնք տարբերվում են ուսուցման տվյալներից: Խաղաբանական դասակարգման ճշգրտությունը ավելի քան 80 տոկոսն էր, մինչդեռ խմբաբանական դասակարգման միջև նույնպես լավ աշխատում էր: Մենք նաև առաջարկում ենք ՖԵ-ի վերացման մեթոդ, որը կիրառվել է ՖԵ-ի կոչվող նախադասությունների համար: Վերջապես, մենք կառուցեցինք և հրատարակեցինք նոր, մեծ ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական տվյալներ: Վերջնական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական տվյալների գնահատումը ցույց տվեց, որ ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկական ֆիզիկա", 'az': '"Bu kağızda, təklif edirik" kimi formül ifadələr (FEs) elmi kağıtlarda çox çox istifadə edilir. FEs, a şağıdaki məsəllərdə "kağıt nişanəsini göstərir" (CF). CF etiketli FE akademik yazmağa yardım etmək üçün faydalı olmasına rağmen, FE verilən verilən tabanların qurması CF etiketlərini təyin etmək üçün manual işə ehtiyacı lazımdır. Bu təhsil içində, CF etiket edilmiş FE veritabanının tamamilə avtomatik in şaatını düşündük. Yuxarı a şağı təhsil ilə CF etiketlərinin ilk dəfə cümlələrə verilmiş və sonra FE etiketlərini çıxarılır. CF-etiket işarəsi üçün CF etiketli cümlələr verilən quruluşu yaratdıq. Bu cümlədə SciBERT klasifikatçısını təhsil etdik. Biz klassifikat və veri quruluğu təhsil məlumatlarından fərqli FE veri tabanlarını inşa etmək üçün kullanılabilir. Diqlinin səviyyətinin doğruluğu 80%-dən çox idi, çox disciplinin səviyyəti də yaxşı işlədi. Biz də CF etiketli cümlələrə istifadə edilən FE extraction metodi təklif edirik. Sonunda yeni, böyük CF etiketli FE veritabanı inşa etdik və yayındırdıq. Sonuncu CF etiketli FE verilən verilənlərin değerlendirməsi FE\'nin yaklaşık 65%-inin doğru və faydalı olduğunu göstərdi. Bu, praktik istifadə etməyə kifayət qədər yüksək olaraq.', 'bs': 'Formule izraze (FE), poput "u ovom papiru, predlažemo", često se koriste u naučnim novinama. FEs predstavlja komunikacijsku funkciju (CF), tj. „pokazuje cilj papira“ u iznimnom primjeru. Iako su FE-ovi označeni na CF-u korisni za pomoć akademijskog pisanja, izgradnja baze podataka FE zahtijeva ručni rad za dodavanje etiketa CF-a. U ovom ispitivanju, smatrali smo potpuno automatskom izgradnji baze podataka s označenom CF-om FE koristeći vrhunski pristup, u kojem su etikete CF prvi put dodeljene rečenicama, a onda se FE izvlače. Za zadatak CF-etikete, stvorili smo komplet podataka označenog CF-a, na kojem smo obučili klasifikatora SciBERT-a. Pokazujemo da se klasifikator i set podataka mogu koristiti za izgradnju baze FE podataka disciplina koje su različite od podataka obuke. Točnost u disciplinarnoj klasifikaciji bila je više od 80%, dok je i krstodisciplinarna klasifikacija dobro funkcionirala. Također predlažemo metodu ekstrakcije FE, koja je primjenjena na rečenice označene na CF-u. Konačno smo izgradili i objavili novu, veliku bazu podataka s označenom CF-om FE. Procjena konačne baze podataka s označenom CF-om FE pokazala je da su približno 65% FE ispravne i korisne, što je dovoljno visoko s obzirom na praktičnu uporabu.', 'bn': 'ফরমুলিক প্রকাশ (এফএসএস), যেমন ‘এই কাগজে আমরা প্রস্তাব করি’ বৈজ্ঞানিক কাগজে প্রায়শ ব্যবহার করা হয়। এফএস একটি যোগাযোগাযোগ ফাংশন (সিএফ) প্রকাশ করেছে, যেমন উপরের উদাহরণে কাগজের লক্ষ্য দেখাচ্ছে। যদিও ক্যাডেমিক লেখার সাহায্য করার জন্য সিএফ-লেবেল করা এফএস সহায়তা প্রদান করে, তবে সিএফ লেবেল বানানোর জন্য FE ডাটাবেস নির্মাণ করার জন্য এই গবেষণায় আমরা পুরো স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে বিবেচনা করেছি একটি সিএফ-লেবেলের তথ্য নির্মাণ নির্মাণ বিবেচনা, যেখানে সিএফ-এর লেবেলের প্রথমে শাস্তির জন্য বি সিএফ-লেবেল মিশনের জন্য আমরা একটি সিএফ-লেবেলেট ডাটাসেট তৈরি করেছি, যেখানে আমরা স্কিবেরেট ক্লাসিফার প্রশিক্ষণ দিয়েছি। We show that the classifier and dataset can be used to construct FE databases of disciplines that are different from the training data.  শাস্তিপূর্ণ শ্রেণীবিভাগের সঠিকভাবে ৮০ শতাংশেরও বেশী ছিল, কিন্তু শাস্তিপূর্ণ শ্রেণীবিভাগের সাথে ভাল এছাড়াও আমরা একটি FE বের করার পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি, যা সিএফ-লেবেলের শাস্তিতে প্রয়োগ করা হয়েছে। শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা একটি নতুন, বিশাল সিএফ-লেবেল করা FE ডাটাবেস নির্মাণ করেছি এবং প্রকাশ করেছি। চূড়ান্ত সিএফ-লেবেল করা FE ডাটাবেসের মূল্য দেখা যাচ্ছে যে এফএসের প্রায় 65% সঠিক এবং উপকারী, যা প্রায় ব্যবহারের ব্যাপারে যথেষ্ট ব্যা', 'ca': "Les expressions fòrmules (FEs), com &lt;br /&gt;en aquest paper, proposem&lt;/br /&gt;es fan servir sovint en articles científics. Les FEs transmetren una funció comunicativa (CF), és a dir, 'mostrar l'objectiu del paper' en l'exemple mencionat. Encara que les FEs etiquetades amb CF són útils per ajudar a l'escriptura acadèmica, la construcció de bases de dades de FE requereix treball manual per assenyar etiquetes amb CF. En aquest estudi, vam considerar una construcció completament automatitzada d'una base de dades FE etiquetada amb CF utilitzant l'enfocament de dalt a baix, en la qual les etiquetes CF s'assenyen per primer cop a frases, i després s'extrauen les FE. Per l'assignació de la etiqueta CF, vam crear un conjunt de dades de frases etiquetat CF, en el qual vam entrenar un classificador SciBERT. We show that the classifier and dataset can be used to construct FE databases of disciplines that are different from the training data.  The accuracy of in-disciplinary classification was more than 80%, while cross-disciplinary classification also worked well.  We also propose an FE extraction method, which was applied to the CF-labelled sentences.  Finalment vam construir i publicar una nova i gran base de dades FE etiquetada amb CF. L'avaluació de la base de dades finals de FE etiquetada amb CF va demostrar que aproximadament el 65% dels FE són correctes i útils, que és prou alt considerant l'ús pràctic.", 'cs': 'Vzorecové výrazy (FEs), jako například "v tomto článku navrhujeme", jsou často používány ve vědeckých článcích. FEs vyjadřují komunikační funkci (CF), tj. "ukázat cíl příspěvku" ve výše uvedeném příkladu. Přestože FEs označené CF jsou užitečné při pomoci akademickém psaní, stavba databází FE vyžaduje ruční práci pro přidělování CF značek. V této studii jsme zvažovali plně automatizovanou konstrukci databáze FE označené CF pomocí přístupu shora dolů, při níž jsou značky CF nejprve přiřazeny k větám a pak jsou extrahovány FEs. Pro přiřazení CF-label jsme vytvořili soubor vět označených CF, na kterém jsme vyškolili klasifikátor SciBERT. Ukazujeme, že klasifikátor a datová sada lze použít k sestavení FE databází disciplín, které se liší od tréninkových dat. Přesnost interdisciplinární klasifikace byla více než 80%, zatímco interdisciplinární klasifikace fungovala také dobře. Navrhujeme také metodu extrakce FE, která byla aplikována na věty označené CF. Nakonec jsme vytvořili a publikovali novou, velkou databázi FE s CF značkou. Vyhodnocení finální databáze FE označené CF ukázalo, že přibližně 65% FEs jsou správné a užitečné, což je dostatečně vysoké vzhledem k praktickému využití.', 'fi': 'Tieteellisissä julkaisuissa käytetään usein kaavailmauksia (FEs), kuten "tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme". FEs:t välittävät edellä mainitussa esimerkissä kommunikatiivisen toiminnon eli "tutkimuksen tarkoituksen osoittamisen". Vaikka CF-merkinnällä varustetut FEt ovat hyödyllisiä akateemisen kirjoittamisen tukemisessa, FE-tietokantojen rakentaminen edellyttää manuaalista työtä CF-merkinnän antamiseksi. Tässä tutkimuksessa tarkasteltiin täysin automatisoitua CF-merkityn FE-tietokannan rakentamista ylhäältä alaspäin -menetelmällä, jossa CF-merkinnät annetaan ensin lauseille ja sitten FEs-merkinnät puretaan. CF-label-määritystä varten luotiin CF-merkitty lauseaineisto, johon koulutimme SciBERT-luokituksen. Osoitamme, että luokituksen ja aineiston avulla voidaan rakentaa FE-tietokantoja eri tieteenaloista kuin koulutustiedoista. Tieteenalan sisäisen luokituksen tarkkuus oli yli 80%, ja poikkitieteellinen luokitus toimi myös hyvin. Ehdotamme myös FE-uuttamismenetelmää, jota sovellettiin CF-merkittyihin lauseisiin. Lopuksi rakensimme ja julkaisimme uuden, suuren CF-merkinnällä varustetun FE-tietokannan. Lopullisen CF-merkinnällä varustetun FE-tietokannan arviointi osoitti, että noin 65 prosenttia FE-tietokannoista on oikeita ja hyödyllisiä, mikä on riittävän suuri käytännön käyttöön nähden.', 'am': 'የፎርማሊክ መልዕክቶች (FEs)፣ እንደዚህ ፕሬዝዳንት፣ እንደምናፈቅዳለን፣ ብዙ ጊዜም በሳይንቀሳዊ ገጾች ይጠቀማሉ፡፡ FEs (CF) የፕሬዝዳንት ጉዳይ ላይ በሚደረገው ምሳሌ የሚያሳየው የግንኙነት ሥራ (CF) ያሳያል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን CF-labeled FEs በአካዳሚክ ጽሑፍ ለመረዳት የሚረዳ ቢሆንም፣ የFE ዳታቤቶች መሠረት ለCF ምልክቶች ለማሳመር የእጅ ሥራ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት፣ የCF ምልክቶች አስቀድሞ ለፍርድ ተሳትተዋል፣ ከዚያም በኋላ FEs ተለይተዋል፡፡ ለCF-label አቀናመጥ የCF-የጽሑፍ ፋንታ ዳታተር መፍጠርን ፈጠርነው፤ በዚህም ላይ SciBERT መግለጫ አስተማርነው። እናሳያቸዋለን የፋይል እና ዳታ-ሰርቨሮች ከቴርሲን ዳታ የተለየ FE ዳታቤቶችን ለመሠረት ይችላል፡፡ ትክክለኛ ክፍል 80 በመቶ የበለጠ ነው፣ የሥርዓት ክፍል ደግሞ መልካም ሆኖአል፡፡ እና በCF-ተግባር የተደረገውን የFE ውጤት ሥርዓት እናሳልጋለን፡፡ በመጨረሻም አዲስ የCF የዳታ መቀመጫን አወራጅተናል እና አወራንታለን፡፡ የመጨረሻው CF-ታወቀው የFE ዳታ መቀመጫው አስተያየት፣ የFEs መቶ 65 በመቶ እውነተኛና የሚጠቅመው ነው፡፡', 'et': 'Teaduslikes artiklites kasutatakse sageli valemväljendeid (FEs), nagu "selles töös me pakume". Eespool nimetatud näites edastavad FEd suhtlusfunktsiooni ehk "näitab töö eesmärki". Kuigi CF märgistusega FEd aitavad kaasa akadeemilisele kirjutamisele, nõuab FE andmebaaside ehitamine CF märgistuse määramiseks käsitsi tööd. Käesolevas uuringus kaaluti CF-märgisega FE andmebaasi täisautomaatset ehitamist, kasutades ülevalt alla lähenemist, kus CF-märgised määratakse esmalt lausetele ja seejärel ekstraheeritakse FEd. CF-märgise määramiseks lõime CF-märgisega lauseandmekogumi, millele koolitasime SciBERT-klassifikaatorit. Näitame, et klassifitseerijat ja andmekogumit saab kasutada koolitusandmetest erinevate erialade FE andmebaaside loomiseks. Distsiplinaarse klassifikatsiooni täpsus oli üle 80%, samas kui valdkondadevaheline klassifikatsioon töötas hästi. Samuti pakume välja FE ekstraheerimismeetodi, mida rakendati CF-märgistusega lausetele. Lõpuks ehitasime ja avaldasime uue suure CF-märgisega FE andmebaasi. CF-märgistusega FE lõpliku andmebaasi hindamine näitas, et ligikaudu 65% FEdest on õiged ja kasulikud, mis on praktilist kasutamist arvestades piisavalt suur.', 'sq': "Shprehjet formuluese (FE), të tilla si `në këtë letër, propozojmë' përdoren shpesh në letra shkencore. FEs transmetojnë një funksion komunikues (CF), i.e. 'duke treguar qëllimin e letrës' në shembullin e përmendur më lart. Although CF-labelled FEs are helpful in assisting academic writing, the construction of FE databases requires manual labour for assigning CF labels.  In this study, we considered a fully automated construction of a CF-labelled FE database using the top-down approach, in which the CF labels are first assigned to sentences, and then the FEs are extracted.  For the CF-label assignment, we created a CF-labelled sentence dataset, on which we trained a SciBERT classifier.  Ne tregojmë se klasifikuesi dhe grupi i të dhënave mund të përdoren për të ndërtuar bazat e të dhënave FE të disiplinave që janë të ndryshme nga të dhënat e stërvitjes. The accuracy of in-disciplinary classification was more than 80%, while cross-disciplinary classification also worked well.  Ne propozojmë gjithashtu një metodë nxjerrjeje FE, e cila u aplikua në frazat me etiketë CF. Më në fund, ndërtuam dhe publikuam një bazë të dhënash të re të madhe me etiketë të CF-së FE. The evaluation of the final CF-labelled FE database showed that approximately 65% of the FEs are correct and useful, which is sufficiently high considering practical use.", 'sk': 'Formulacijski izrazi (FEs), kot je ‚v tem članku predlagamo\', se pogosto uporabljajo v znanstvenih člankih. FEs prenašajo komunikacijsko funkcijo (CF), tj. "prikazovanje cilja prispevka" v zgoraj navedenem primeru. Čeprav so pri akademskem pisanju podatkovnih baz podatkov podatkov podatkov podatkov podatkov FE koristni pri izdelavi oznak CF. V tej študiji smo obravnavali popolnoma avtomatizirano gradnjo baze podatkov FE z oznako CF z uporabo pristopa od zgoraj navzdol, pri čemer so oznake CF najprej dodeljene stavkom, nato pa se FEs izvlečejo. Za dodelitev oznake CF smo ustvarili nabor podatkov o stavkih s CF oznako, na katerem smo usposobili klasifikator SciBERT. Pokazali smo, da se klasifikator in nabor podatkov lahko uporablja za gradnjo podatkovnih baz FE disciplin, ki se razlikujejo od podatkov o usposabljanju. Natančnost in-disciplinarne klasifikacije je bila več kot 80%, medtem ko je dobro delovala tudi meddisciplinarna klasifikacija. Predlagamo tudi metodo ekstrakcije FE, ki je bila uporabljena za stavke označene s CF. Na koncu smo zgradili in objavili novo, veliko podatkovno bazo FE z oznako CF. Ocena končne baze podatkov FE, označene s CF, je pokazala, da je približno 65% FEs pravilnih in koristnih, kar je dovolj visoko glede na praktično uporabo.', 'ha': "Tsarin formulaki (FEs), kamar `in wannan takarda, muna bukãtar da shi, za'a yi amfani da shi a kan karatun masu sakan. FEs yana iyar da wani aikin da aka haɗa (CF), misali 'ya nuna aim in takardar' cikin misali da aka faɗa a sama. Ingawa da aka aikata CF-na-FEs yana da amfani da taimakon littãfin akada, ginan database na FF yana son aikin manual zuwa raba alama na CF. In this study, we considered a fully automated construction of a CF-labelled FE database using the top-down approach, in which the CF labels are first assigned to sentences, and then the FEs are extracted.  Ga shirin CF-label, muka halitta wani danne na cewa na CF-aka yi taƙaita, wanda muka sanar da wani ShaiBERT. Tuna nũna cewa tsari da zaluman za'a iya amfani da wajen samun danne na FU masu tsari waɗanda ke sãɓãni daga danne na tsarin. Tsarinsa na cikin fasalar-discipline na ƙari 80%, kuma da fassarar-mai-disiplin sun aikata aikin ƙwarai. Kayya, Munã goyya da shirin zartar da FU, wanda aka cika zuwa da cewa na CF. Haƙĩƙa, mun sami kuma muka bayyana wani danne mai girma da aka yi wa CF. Ana ƙaddara danne na CF-da aka aikata ƙarshen FF ya nuna cewa taki 65% na FEs na gaske kuma yana da amfani, da kuma yana isa ga mai cikakken amfani da mai gaske.", 'jv': 'Wurungu peruahaan (Fes), koyo "nang alih iki, kéné nggunakake" kang dipulangan karo pakan saiki. (CF) Nombo CF-label Nang barêng-barêng iki, awake dhewe sawetake sistem sing beraksi perusahaan mên wehku nggawe barang CF liyane wis etiket kenbot nambah nambah CF-label Awak dhéwé menehi wong pada-seneng karo dataset sing iso nggawe databasa é digangkat nggawe Where Awak dhéwé mulai nggunakake perangkat sing wis nggambar "KE", sing wis nambah kang CF-etiket nang daftar. Ero, kéné nggawe lan publikasi akeh dumaten weh dumaten CF-etiket mbahasar Wanggalih barêng-barêng ngengambar CF sing gambar dikenakno wong dhéwé isih luwih-luwih kanggo 60% sing mengko cah-cah bener lan barang cebo dhéwé, sing paling langkung wih-itik nggunakaé pratike kuwi.', 'bo': 'དབྱིབས་བཟོས་ཅན་གྱི་གསལ་བརྗོད་(FEs)དཔེར་ན་ "ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ།"ང་ཚོས་སྔོན་འཆར་བཀོད་ཡོད། FEs སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་དཔེར་བརྗོད་ནང་། Although CF-labelled FEs are helpful in assisting academic writing, the construction of FE databases requires manual labour for assigning CF labels. In this study, we considered a fully automated construction of a CF-labelled FE database using the top-down approach, in which the CF labels are first assigned to sentences, and then the FEs are extracted. For the CF-label assignment, we created a CF-labelled sentence dataset, on which we trained a SciBERT classifier. ང་ཚོས་དབྱིབས་འཛིན་བྱེད་མཁན་དང་སྒྲིག་གནད་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་གནས་སྡུད་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དབྱེ་སྡོམ་གྱི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་དེ་བཞིན་འགྱུར་བ་ཡིན། སྡོད་རིམ་གྱི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ཀྱང་དཔལ་ཤོར་བ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་CF-labelled ཚིག་རྟགས་བཀོད་ཡོད་པའི་FE་འཕར་རིས་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ཀྱང་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Finally, we constructed and published a new, large CF-labelled FE database. The evaluation of the final CF-labelled FE database showed that approximately 65% of the FEs are correct and useful, which is sufficiently high considering practical use.', 'he': 'Formulaic expressions (FEs), such as `in this paper, we propose\' are frequently used in scientific papers.  FEs מעבירים תפקיד תקשורת (CF), כלומר "מראה את המטרה של הנייר" בדוגמה הזכירה. Although CF-labelled FEs are helpful in assisting academic writing, the construction of FE databases requires manual labour for assigning CF labels.  In this study, we considered a fully automated construction of a CF-labelled FE database using the top-down approach, in which the CF labels are first assigned to sentences, and then the FEs are extracted.  עבור המשימה של תווית סי.פי.איי, יצרנו קבוצת מידע משפטים עם תווית סי.פי.איי, שבה אימנו מסווג סייברט. אנחנו מראים שהמסווג ומערכת נתונים יכולים להשתמש בבניית בסיסי נתונים של FE של משמעות שונים מהנתונים האימונים. The accuracy of in-disciplinary classification was more than 80%, while cross-disciplinary classification also worked well.  We also propose an FE extraction method, which was applied to the CF-labelled sentences.  Finally, we constructed and published a new, large CF-labelled FE database.  הערכה של מסד הנתונים הסופי של פי-סי-סי-סי-סי-סי-סי-סי-סי-סי-סי-סי-סי-סי-סי-סי-סי-סי-סי-סי-סי-סי-סי-סי-סי'}
{'en': 'From the Stage to the Audience : Propaganda on Reddit', 'ar': 'من المسرح إلى الجمهور: الدعاية على Reddit', 'pt': 'Do palco para o público: propaganda no Reddit', 'es': 'Del escenario al público: propaganda en Reddit', 'fr': 'De la scène au public\xa0: la propagande sur Reddit', 'ja': '舞台から観客へ： Redditでのプロパガンダ', 'zh': '自舞台至观众,Reddit上宣传', 'ru': 'От сцены к зрителям: пропаганда на Reddit', 'hi': 'मंच से दर्शकों के लिए: Reddit पर प्रचार', 'ga': 'Ón gCéim go dtí an Lucht Féachana: Propaganda ar Reddit', 'ka': 'რედიტის პროპადანდია', 'hu': 'A színpadtól a közönséghez: Propaganda a Redditen', 'it': 'Dal palco al pubblico: Propaganda su Reddit', 'kk': 'Төменнен аудиторияға: Редит пропаганда', 'mk': 'From the Stage to the Audience: Propaganda on Reddit', 'el': 'Από τη σκηνή στο κοινό: Προπaganda στο Reddit', 'lt': 'From the Stage to the Audience: Propaganda on Reddit', 'mt': 'From the Stage to the Audience: Propaganda on Reddit', 'mn': 'Штайгаас хүмүүст хүртэл: Редит дэх пропаганда', 'no': 'Fra staden til publikumet: Propaganda for redigering', 'ml': 'സ്റ്റേജില്\u200d നിന്നും ശക്തികളിലേക്ക്: റെഡിഡിലെ പ്രൊഫഗണ്ട', 'pl': 'Od sceny do publiczności: Propaganda na Reddit', 'ro': 'De pe scenă până în public: Propaganda pe Reddit', 'si': 'ස්ටේජ් වලින් ප්\u200dරේක්ෂකයෙන්: රෙඩිට් වලින් ප්\u200dරොපාගන්ඩා', 'sr': 'Od staze do publike: propaganda na Reddit', 'sv': 'Från scenen till publiken: Propaganda på Reddit', 'ta': 'From the Stage to the Audience: Propaganda on Reddit', 'so': 'Jardiiska ilaa hay’adaha: Propaganda on Reddit', 'ms': 'From the Stage to the Audience: Propaganda on Reddit', 'ur': 'Stage سے Audience: Reddit پر پروپاگنڈ', 'vi': 'Từ sân khấu tới khán giả: propaganda on Reddit', 'uz': 'Tashkilotdan tashkilotga: Rededit kabi Propaganda', 'bg': 'От сцената до публиката: пропаганда в Редит', 'nl': 'Van het podium naar het publiek: Propaganda op Reddit', 'da': 'Fra scenen til publikum: Propaganda på Reddit', 'hr': 'Od staze do publike: propaganda za Reddit', 'de': 'Von der Bühne zum Publikum: Propaganda auf Reddit', 'ko': '무대에서 관객까지: 레딧의 홍보', 'id': 'Dari Tahap ke Penonton: Propaganda di Reddit', 'fa': 'از نقطه به تماشاگران: پروپاگاندا بر ردیدت', 'sw': 'From the Stage to the Audience: Propaganda on Reddit', 'tr': 'Stajdan Publikçiye kadar:Kıyamet üzerinde Propaganda', 'af': 'Van die Stapel tot die Publiek: Propaganda op Reddit', 'am': 'ከደረጃው ጀምሮ እስከ ታዳቢዎች ድረስ፤ የRededit Propaganda', 'hy': 'From the Stage to the Audience: Propaganda on Reddit', 'az': 'Stajdan Auditoriy…Щ q…Щd…Щr: Reddit Propaganda', 'bn': 'স্টেজ থেকে দর্শকদের কাছ থেকে: রেডিডিটের প্রোপাঞ্জেন্ডা', 'sq': 'From the Stage to the Audience: Propaganda on Reddit', 'bs': 'Od staze do publike: propaganda o Reddit', 'fi': 'Lavalta yleisöön: Propaganda Redditissä', 'ca': "Des de l'etapa al públic: Propaganda en Reddit", 'et': 'Lavalt publikuni: propaganda Redditis', 'cs': 'Z jeviště k publiku: Propaganda na Redditu', 'jv': 'Sugeng tanggal nang rawuh sing ditambah ning rawuh: profasan nang Redit', 'ha': 'From the Stage to the Audience: Propaganda on Reddit', 'he': 'From the Stage to the Audience: Propaganda on Reddit', 'bo': 'བགོ་རིམ་ལས་འགོ་བཙུགས་སྐབས། བསྐྱར་ཐོག་ཏུ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག', 'sk': 'Od odra do občinstva: Propaganda na Redditu'}
{'en': 'Political discussions revolve around ideological conflicts that often split the audience into two opposing parties. Both parties try to win the argument by bringing forward information. However, often this information is misleading, and its dissemination employs propaganda techniques. In this work, we analyze the impact of propaganda on six major political forums on Reddit that target a diverse audience in two countries, the US and the UK. We focus on three research questions : who is posting propaganda? how does propaganda differ across the political spectrum? and how is propaganda received on political forums?', 'ar': 'تدور النقاشات السياسية حول الصراعات الأيديولوجية التي غالبًا ما تقسم الجمهور إلى حزبين متعارضين. يحاول كلا الطرفين كسب الجدال من خلال تقديم المعلومات. ومع ذلك ، غالبًا ما تكون هذه المعلومات مضللة ، ويتم نشرها باستخدام تقنيات الدعاية. في هذا العمل ، نقوم بتحليل تأثير الدعاية في ستة منتديات سياسية رئيسية على Reddit تستهدف جمهورًا متنوعًا في بلدين ، الولايات المتحدة والمملكة المتحدة. نحن نركز على ثلاثة أسئلة بحثية: من ينشر الدعاية؟ كيف تختلف الدعاية عبر الطيف السياسي؟ وكيف يتم استقبال الدعاية في المنتديات السياسية؟', 'es': 'Las discusiones políticas giran en torno a conflictos ideológicos que a menudo dividen a la audiencia en dos partidos opuestos. Ambas partes tratan de ganar la discusión presentando información. Sin embargo, a menudo esta información es engañosa y su difusión emplea técnicas de propaganda. En este trabajo, analizamos el impacto de la propaganda en seis foros políticos importantes de Reddit que se dirigen a un público diverso en dos países, los Estados Unidos y el Reino Unido. Nos centramos en tres preguntas de investigación: ¿quién publica propaganda? ¿en qué se diferencia la propaganda en todo el espectro político? y ¿cómo se recibe la propaganda en los foros políticos?', 'pt': 'As discussões políticas giram em torno de conflitos ideológicos que muitas vezes dividem o público em dois partidos opostos. Ambas as partes tentam ganhar a discussão apresentando informações. No entanto, muitas vezes essas informações são enganosas, e sua divulgação emprega técnicas de propaganda. Neste trabalho, analisamos o impacto da propaganda em seis grandes fóruns políticos no Reddit que visam um público diversificado em dois países, EUA e Reino Unido. Focamos em três questões de pesquisa: quem está postando propaganda? como a propaganda difere em todo o espectro político? e como a propaganda é recebida nos fóruns políticos?', 'fr': "Les discussions politiques tournent autour de conflits idéologiques qui divisent souvent le public en deux parties opposées. Les deux parties tentent de gagner leur cause en fournissant des informations. Cependant, ces informations sont souvent trompeuses et leur diffusion fait appel à des techniques de propagande. Dans ce travail, nous analysons l'impact de la propagande sur six grands forums politiques sur Reddit qui ciblent un public diversifié dans deux pays, les États-Unis et le Royaume-Uni. Nous nous concentrons sur trois questions de recherche\xa0: qui publie de la propagande\xa0? en quoi la propagande diffère-t-elle selon l'échiquier politique\xa0? et comment la propagande est-elle reçue sur les forums politiques\xa0?", 'ja': '政治的議論は、しばしば聴衆を対立する2つの政党に分裂させるイデオロギー的対立を中心に展開される。両当事者は、情報を前面に出すことで議論を勝ち取ろうとする。しかし、この情報はしばしば誤解を招くものであり、その普及はプロパガンダの手法を採用している。この作品では、米国と英国の2つの国の多様な読者を対象としたRedditの6つの主要な政治フォーラムへのプロパガンダの影響を分析します。私たちは3つの研究の質問に焦点を当てています誰がプロパガンダを投稿しているのでしょうか？プロパガンダは政治的な分野でどのように異なるのでしょうか？そしてプロパガンダは政治的なフォーラムでどのように受け取られているのでしょうか？', 'hi': 'राजनीतिक चर्चाएं वैचारिक संघर्षों के इर्द-गिर्द घूमती हैं जो अक्सर दर्शकों को दो विरोधी दलों में विभाजित करती हैं। दोनों पक्ष जानकारी को सामने लाकर तर्क जीतने की कोशिश करते हैं। हालांकि, अक्सर यह जानकारी भ्रामक होती है, और इसका प्रसार प्रचार तकनीकों को नियोजित करता है। इस काम में, हम Reddit पर छह प्रमुख राजनीतिक मंचों पर प्रचार के प्रभाव का विश्लेषण करते हैं जो दो देशों, अमेरिका और ब्रिटेन में एक विविध दर्शकों को लक्षित करते हैं। हम तीन शोध प्रश्नों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं: कौन प्रचार पोस्ट कर रहा है? राजनीतिक स्पेक्ट्रम में प्रचार कैसे भिन्न होता है? और राजनीतिक मंचों पर प्रचार कैसे प्राप्त किया जाता है?', 'zh': '政论绕意识形态开,往往分两政党。 两家俱试供信息。 然往往有误导性,其传用宣传。 论Reddit六大政论坛宣,论坛美国英之异受众。 我们专注三个研究:谁在宣传? 宣传在政光谱何以异? 在政论坛何以受宣?', 'ru': 'Политические дискуссии вращаются вокруг идеологических конфликтов, которые часто разделяют аудиторию на две противоположные партии. Обе стороны пытаются выиграть спор, представляя информацию. Однако зачастую эта информация вводит в заблуждение, и в ее распространении используются методы пропаганды. В этой работе мы анализируем влияние пропаганды на шесть крупных политических форумов на Reddit, которые нацелены на разнообразную аудиторию в двух странах, США и Великобритании. Мы фокусируемся на трех исследовательских вопросах: кто размещает пропаганду? чем отличается пропаганда в политическом спектре? и как пропаганда воспринимается на политических форумах?', 'ga': 'Tá plé polaitiúil bunaithe ar choinbhleachtaí idé-eolaíocha a scarann an lucht éisteachta go minic ina dhá pháirtí fhreasúracha. Déanann an dá pháirtí iarracht an argóint a bhuachan trí fhaisnéis a thabhairt chun cinn. Mar sin féin, is minic a bhíonn an fhaisnéis seo míthreorach, agus úsáideann a scaipeadh teicnící bolscaireachta. San obair seo, déanaimid anailís ar thionchar na bolscaireachta ar shé mhórfhóram pholaitiúla ar Reddit a dhíríonn ar lucht éisteachta éagsúil in dhá thír, SAM agus an RA. Dírímid ar thrí cheist taighde: cé atá ag postáil bolscaireacht? conas a bhíonn bolscaireacht éagsúil trasna an speictrim pholaitiúil? agus conas a fhaightear bolscaireacht ar fhóraim pholaitiúla?', 'el': 'Οι πολιτικές συζητήσεις περιστρέφονται γύρω από ιδεολογικές συγκρούσεις που συχνά χωρίζουν το κοινό σε δύο αντίπαλα κόμματα. Και τα δύο μέρη προσπαθούν να κερδίσουν το επιχείρημα φέρνοντας πληροφορίες. Ωστόσο, συχνά αυτές οι πληροφορίες είναι παραπλανητικές και η διάδοσή τους χρησιμοποιεί τεχνικές προπαγάνδας. Σε αυτή την εργασία, αναλύουμε τον αντίκτυπο της προπαγάνδας σε έξι μεγάλα πολιτικά φόρουμ στο Reddit που στοχεύουν σε ένα διαφορετικό κοινό σε δύο χώρες, τις ΗΠΑ και το Ηνωμένο Βασίλειο. Εστιάζουμε σε τρία ερευνητικά ερωτήματα: ποιος δημοσιεύει προπαγάνδα; Πώς διαφέρει η προπαγάνδα σε όλο το πολιτικό φάσμα; και πώς γίνεται δεκτή η προπαγάνδα στα πολιτικά φόρουμ;', 'ka': 'პოლიტიკური განსაზღვრებები იდეოლოგიური კონფლიქტების გარეშე, რომელიც ხშირად აუდიციოს ორი განსაზღვრებული ოფლიქტებში გაყოფილი. ორივე ოჯახი იცდილობენ აპროგუმენტის გადავიღოთ ინფორმაციას წარმოადგილებით. მაგრამ, ეს ინფორმაცია ძალიან შეცდომა, და მისი განსხვავება პროგადანდის ტექნოგიების გამოყენება. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ დავაანალიზებთ პროგადანდის ექვსი მნიშვნელოვანი პოლიტიკური ფორმებზე რედიტის შესახებ, რომელიც განსხვავებული აუდიტორია ორი ქვეყნებში, ამერიკულია ჩვენ სამი შესწავლობის კითხვაზე კონუქტირებით: ვინ პროგადანეთს? როგორ პროპადანდია პოლიტიკური სპექტრემის განსხვავება? და როგორ პროგადანდის პოლიტიკური ფორმებში მიღება?', 'hu': 'A politikai viták ideológiai konfliktusok körül forognak, amelyek gyakran két ellentétes pártra osztják a közönséget. Mindkét fél tájékoztatással próbálja megnyerni az érvet. Gyakran azonban ez az információ félrevezető, és terjesztése propagandatechnikákat alkalmaz. Ebben a munkában elemezzük a propaganda hatását hat nagy Reddit politikai fórumon, amelyek két országban, az Egyesült Államokban és az Egyesült Királyságban sokszínű közönséget céloznak meg. Három kutatási kérdésre összpontosítunk: ki posztol propagandát? Hogyan különbözik a propaganda a politikai spektrumon belül? És hogyan fogadják a propagandát a politikai fórumokon?', 'it': "Le discussioni politiche ruotano attorno a conflitti ideologici che spesso dividono il pubblico in due partiti opposti. Entrambe le parti cercano di vincere l'argomento presentando informazioni. Tuttavia, spesso queste informazioni sono fuorvianti e la loro diffusione utilizza tecniche di propaganda. In questo lavoro analizziamo l'impatto della propaganda su sei importanti forum politici su Reddit che si rivolgono a un pubblico diversificato in due paesi, gli Stati Uniti e il Regno Unito. Ci concentriamo su tre domande di ricerca: chi sta pubblicando propaganda? in che modo la propaganda differisce in tutto lo spettro politico? E come viene ricevuta la propaganda nei forum politici?", 'mk': 'Политичките дискусии се вртат околу идеолошките конфликти кои честопати ја поделија публиката во две спротивни партии. Двете партии се обидуваат да го добијат аргументот со предавање информации. However, often this information is misleading, and its dissemination employs propaganda techniques.  Во оваа работа, го анализираме влијанието на пропагандата на шест големи политички форуми на Редит кои се насочени кон различна публика во две земји, САД и Велика Британија. Се фокусираме на три истражувачки прашања: кој поставува пропаганда? how does propaganda differ across the political spectrum?  and how is propaganda received on political forums?', 'lt': 'Politinės diskusijos apsiriboja ideologiniais konfliktais, kurie dažnai padalija auditoriją į dvi priešingas šalis. Both parties try to win the argument by bringing forward information.  Tačiau dažnai ši informacija klaidina, o jos sklaida naudoja propagandos metodus. Šiame darbe analizuojame propagandos poveikį šešiems pagrindiniams politiniams forumams Reddit, kuriais siekiama skirtingos auditorijos dviejose šalyse – JAV ir Jungtinėje Karalystėje. Mes daugiausia dėmesio skiriame trims moksliniams tyrimams: kas skelbia propagandą? kaip propaganda įvairiuose politiniuose spektruose skiriasi? ir kaip propaganda gaunama politiniuose forumuose?', 'ml': 'രാഷ്ട്രീയ സംസാരം ആശയോഗ്യമായ കുഴപ്പങ്ങളുടെ ചുറ്റില്\u200d വീണുപോകുന്നു. പ്രാവശ്യം കാഴ്ചകളെ രണ്ട് എതിര്\u200d രണ്ടു പാര്\u200dട്ടികളും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നതിനാല്\u200d വിവാദം ജയിക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്നു. എന്നാലും പലപ്പോഴും ഈ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വഴിപിഴപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ വ്യാപ്തമാക്കുന്നത് പ്രപഞ്ചന സാങ്കേതികവ ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ആറു പ്രധാന രാഷ്ട്രീയ ഫോറമില്\u200d പ്രപഞ്ചന പ്രഭാവം വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. രണ്ടു രാജ്യങ്ങളില്\u200d രണ്ട് രാജ്യങ്ങളിലെ  നമ്മള്\u200d മൂന്നു പരിശോധന ചോദ്യങ്ങളില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു: ആരാണ് പ്രൊപാഗണ്ടാ പോസ്റ്റ് ചെയ്യ രാഷ്ട്രീയ സംസാരത്തില്\u200d പ്രപദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നതെങ്ങനെയാണ്? രാഷ്ട്രീയ ഫോര്\u200dമുകളില്\u200d പ്രൊപാഗണ്ട എങ്ങനെ ലഭിക്കുന്നു?', 'kk': 'Саяси дискуссиялары идеологиялық конфликттерді көбінесе аудиториясын екі қарсы партияларға бөлінеді. Екі партилер аргументті алғашқы мәліметті келтіріп жеңілуге тырысқан. Бірақ бұл мәлімет көпшілікті жалғастырып, оның таратуы пропаганда техникаларын жұмыс істейді. Бұл жұмыстың алты негізгі саяси форумында пропагандың нәтижесін Реддит-ге анализ. Бұл екі елде, АҚШ және Британияда әртүрлі аудиториялардың әртүрлі аудиториясын қалайды. Біз үш зерттеу сұрақтарына көздейміз: кім пропаганды жібереді? Пропаганда саяси спектруммен қалай айырылады? саяси форумында пропаганда қалай алды?', 'mn': 'Улс төрийн ярилцлагууд ирээдүйн зөрчилдөөнүүдийг ихэвчлэн зөрчилдөөнүүдийг хоёр эсрэг партид хувааж байна. Хоёр тал хоёр нь мэдээллийг илгээж аргументыг ялахыг хичээдэг. Гэвч энэ мэдээлэл ихэвчлэн буруу байдаг, түүний тархалт нь пропаганда техник ашигладаг. Энэ ажил дээр бид Reddit-д дэлхийн 6 чухал улс төрийн захирал дээр дэлхийн нөлөөг шинжилдэг. Энэ нь хоёр улс орнууд, Америк болон Англи улс төрийн олон сонсогчид зориулсан. Бид 3 судалгааны асуулт дээр анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлж байна: хэн дэвшүүлж байна вэ? Улс төрийн спектрийг хэрхэн өөрчлөх вэ? улс төрийн форумууд хэрхэн дэмжигдсэн вэ?', 'mt': "Political discussions revolve around ideological conflicts that often split the audience into two opposing parties.  Both parties try to win the argument by bringing forward information.  Madankollu, spiss din l-informazzjoni hija qarrieqa, u t-tixrid tagħha juża tekniki ta’ propaganda. F’din il-ħidma, a ħna nianalizzaw l-impatt tal-propaganda fuq sitt fora politiċi ewlenin fuq Reddit li jimmiraw lejn udjenza diversifikata f’żewġ pajjiżi, l-Istati Uniti u r-Renju Unit. Aħna niffokaw fuq tliet mistoqsijiet ta' riċerka: min qed jippubblika l-propaganda? kif il-propaganda tvarja fl-ispettru politiku? u kif tiġi riċevuta l-propaganda fil-fora politiċi?", 'ms': 'Political discussions revolve around ideological conflicts that often split the audience into two opposing parties.  Both parties try to win the argument by bringing forward information.  However, often this information is misleading, and its dissemination employs propaganda techniques.  In this work, we analyze the impact of propaganda on six major political forums on Reddit that target a diverse audience in two countries, the US and the UK.  We focus on three research questions: who is posting propaganda?  how does propaganda differ across the political spectrum?  and how is propaganda received on political forums?', 'no': 'Politiske diskusjonar revolver rundt ideologiske konflikter som ofte deler publikum til to mottakande partiar. Begge partir prøver å vinna argumentet ved å henta framover informasjon. Men ofte er denne informasjonen misleading, og disseminasjonen brukar propagandteknikk. I denne arbeiden analyserer vi effekten av propaganda på seks stor politiske forum på Reddit som målar eit ulike publikum i to land, USA og Storbritannia. Vi fokuserer på tre forskningsspørsmål: Kva sender propaganda? Korleis forskjeller propaganda over den politiske spektrumen? og korleis er propaganda motteken på politiske forum?', 'pl': 'Dyskusje polityczne toczą się wokół konfliktów ideologicznych, które często dzielą publiczność na dwie przeciwne partie. Obie strony starają się wygrać argument przedstawiając informacje. Często jednak informacje te są mylące, a jej rozpowszechnianie wykorzystuje techniki propagandowe. W niniejszej pracy analizujemy wpływ propagandy na sześć głównych forach politycznych Redditu, skierowanych do zróżnicowanych odbiorców w dwóch krajach, USA i Wielkiej Brytanii. Skupiamy się na trzech pytaniach badawczych: kto publikuje propagandę? Jak różni się propaganda w całym spektrum politycznym? i jak propaganda jest odbierana na forach politycznych?', 'ro': 'Discuțiile politice se învârt în jurul conflictelor ideologice care deseori împart audiența în două partide opuse. Ambele părți încearcă să câștige argumentul aducând informații. Cu toate acestea, adesea aceste informații sunt înșelătoare, iar diseminarea sa utilizează tehnici de propagandă. În această lucrare, analizăm impactul propagandei pe șase forumuri politice majore de pe Reddit care vizează un public divers din două țări, SUA și Marea Britanie. Ne concentrăm pe trei întrebări de cercetare: cine postează propaganda? Cum diferă propaganda de-a lungul spectrului politic? Şi cum este primită propaganda pe forumurile politice?', 'sr': 'Političke diskusije se okreću oko ideoloških sukoba koji često podele publiku u dve suprotne stranke. Obje strane pokušavaju osvojiti argument donošeći informacije. Međutim, često je ova informacija pogrešna, a njegova širenja koristi propagandne tehnike. U ovom poslu analiziramo uticaj propagande na šest glavnih političkih foruma na Reddit koji cilja različite publike u dve zemlje, SAD i UK. Fokusiramo se na tri istraživanja: ko postavlja propagandu? Kako se propaganda razlikuje širom političkog spektra? i kako se propaganda prima na političkim forumima?', 'so': "Talobixiyayaasha siyaasadeedku waxay ku wareegtaa muran fikradeed, kuwaas oo inta badan dhegaha u kala qeybinaya laba kooxood oo ka gees ah. Labada kooxood waxay isku dayaan inay xaaladda ku guulaystaan si ay u keenaan macluumaad. However, often this information is misleading, and its dissemination employs propaganda techniques.  Shaqadan, waxaynu baaraynaa saamaynta propaganda ku saabsan lix forumo siyaasadeed oo muhiimka ah ee Reddit, kaas oo ku hagaajiya dhegayaal kala duduwan labada wadan, Mareykanka iyo UK. Saddex su'aalood baaritaanta waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa: Yaa soo diraya propaganda? sidee propaganda u kala duwan yihiin hadalka siyaasada? iyo sida uu u helaa propaganda guud siyaasadeed?", 'sv': 'Politiska diskussioner kretsar kring ideologiska konflikter som ofta delar upp publiken i två motsatta partier. Båda parter försöker vinna argumentet genom att föra fram information. Men ofta är denna information vilseledande och spridningen av den använder propagandatekniker. I detta arbete analyserar vi propagandans inverkan på sex stora politiska forum på Reddit som riktar sig till en mångfaldig publik i två länder, USA och Storbritannien. Vi fokuserar på tre forskningsfrågor: vem publicerar propaganda? Hur skiljer sig propaganda åt inom det politiska spektrumet? och hur tas propaganda emot i politiska forum?', 'ur': 'سیاسی بحث ایڈیولوژیکی اختلاف کے بارے میں پھیر رہے ہیں جو اہلِ نظر کو دو مخالف پارتی میں تقسیم کرتے ہیں۔ دونوں فریقوں نے آگے معلومات لانے کے ذریعہ حجت کو غالب کرنے کی کوشش کی۔ لیکن اکثر یہ معلومات گمراہ ہوتی ہے اور اس کی پراپاگنڈی تکنیک استعمال کرتی ہے۔ اس کام میں ہم نے ریڈیٹ کے چھ بڑے سیاسی فورموں پر پروپاگنڈ کا اثر تحقیق کیا جو دو ملک، امریکا اور انگلیسی میں ایک مختلف اہل کو موجود رکھتا ہے۔ ہم تین تحقیق سوال پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں: کس نے پرپاگنڈا ڈال دیا ہے؟ پورپاگاندا سیاسی جگہ میں کس طرح اختلاف کرتا ہے؟ اور سیاسی فرموم پر پروپاگنڈا کیسے ملی جاتی ہے؟', 'si': 'රාජ්\u200dයාත්මක කතා කරනවා අදහස් විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ වෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරධානි දෙන්නම් පාටියෝ දෙන්නම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දිනන්න උත්සාහ කරනවා මුළු තොරතුරු ගෙනියන්න. නමුත්, මේ තොරතුරු වැරදි වෙනවා, ඒ වගේම ඒකේ විස්තර කරන්න ප්\u200dරොපාගන්ඩා තාක්ෂණාව භාවිත කරනවා. මේ වැඩේ අපි විශ්ලේෂ කරනවා ප්\u200dරොපාගන්ඩාගේ ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්ලේෂ කරනවා රෙඩ්ඩිට් වල ප්\u200dරධාන රාජකාරී අපි පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තුනක් ගැන බලන්න: කවුද ප්\u200dරොපාගන්ඩාව පොස්ට් කරන්නේ? ප්\u200dරොපාගන්ඩා කොහොමද රාජ්\u200dයාත්මක ස්පෙක්ටර් එක්ක වෙනස් වෙන්නේ? ඒ වගේම කොහොමද රාජ්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරොපාගන්ඩාව ලැබෙන්නේ?', 'ta': 'அரசியல் வாசிப்புகள் சுற்றி யோசனையான குழப்பங்களை சுற்றி மாறுகிறது அது பெரும்பாலாக பார்வைகளை இரு எதி இரண்டு பிரிவினரும் தகவலை கொண்டு விவாதத்தை வெற்ற முயற்சி செய்கிறார்கள். However, often this information is misleading, and its dissemination employs propaganda techniques.  இந்த வேலையில், நாம் விரிவாக்கத்தின் விளைவுகளை ஆறு முக்கிய அரசியல் குறிப்புகள் மீது ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம். இது இரண்டு நாடுகளில் இர நாம் மூன்று ஆராய்ச்சி கேள்விகளை கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம்: how does propaganda differ across the political spectrum?  அரசியல் குறிப்புகளில் எவ்வாறு புரிந்திருக்கிறது?', 'uz': "Siyasi talablar o'zgarishni ko'p paytda o'quvchilarni ikki boshqaruvchi bo'lgan murakkablarga o'zgartiradi. Икки гуруҳлар маълумотни олиб келиш билан ҳужжатни ғолиб қилишни истарлар. Lekin, ko'pincha bu maʼlumot yolg'on qiladi, va bu ta'siri propaganda teknikalarni ishlaydi. Bu ishda, biz ikki davlatda, AQSH va UK davlatda bir necha audience bilan ko'plab keladigan odamlarning 6 asosiy forumlariga o'zgarishga harakat qilamiz. Biz uchta ta ta'qish savollariga foydalanamiz: propaganda qaytadi? how does propaganda differ across the political spectrum?  va qanday foydalanilgan propaganda xabar bo'ladi?", 'vi': 'Những cuộc tranh luận chính trị xoay quanh xung đột xung đột... mà thường chia thính giả thành hai phe đối lập. Hai bên đều cố gắng thắng bằng cách cung cấp thông tin. Tuy nhiên, thông tin này thường là sai lầm, và phát triển nó dùng công nghệ tuyên truyền. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi phân tích tác động của tuyên truyền lên sáu tổ chức chính trị lớn về Reddit, đã nhắm đến một lượng khách hàng khác nhau ở hai quốc gia, Mỹ và Anh. Chúng ta tập trung vào ba câu hỏi nghiên cứu: Ai là người tuyên truyền? Làm sao truyền giáo có thể phân biệt được? Và làm thế nào để tuyên truyền lên diễn đàn chính trị?', 'da': 'Politiske diskussioner drejer sig om ideologiske konflikter, der ofte deler publikum i to modsatte partier. Begge parter forsøger at vinde argumentet ved at fremlægge oplysninger. Men ofte er disse oplysninger vildledende, og dens udbredelse anvender propagandateknikker. I dette arbejde analyserer vi propagandaens indvirkning på seks store politiske fora på Reddit, der er rettet mod et forskelligartet publikum i to lande, USA og Storbritannien. Vi fokuserer på tre forskningsspørgsmål: Hvem sender propaganda? Hvordan adskiller propaganda sig på tværs af det politiske spektrum? og hvordan modtages propaganda på politiske fora?', 'nl': 'Politieke discussies draaien om ideologische conflicten die het publiek vaak opsplitsen in twee tegenpartijen. Beide partijen proberen het argument te winnen door informatie naar voren te brengen. Vaak is deze informatie echter misleidend, en de verspreiding ervan maakt gebruik van propagandatechnieken. In dit werk analyseren we de impact van propaganda op zes grote politieke fora op Reddit die zich richten op een divers publiek in twee landen, de VS en het Verenigd Koninkrijk. We richten ons op drie onderzoeksvragen: wie plaatst propaganda? Hoe verschilt propaganda over het politieke spectrum? en hoe wordt propaganda ontvangen op politieke fora?', 'de': 'Politische Diskussionen drehen sich um ideologische Konflikte, die das Publikum oft in zwei gegensätzliche Parteien spalten. Beide Parteien versuchen, das Argument mit Informationen zu gewinnen. Oft sind diese Informationen jedoch irreführend, und ihre Verbreitung verwendet Propagandatechniken. In dieser Arbeit analysieren wir die Auswirkungen von Propaganda auf sechs große politische Foren auf Reddit, die ein vielfältiges Publikum in zwei Ländern ansprechen, den USA und Großbritannien. Wir konzentrieren uns auf drei Forschungsfragen: Wer postet Propaganda? Wie unterscheidet sich Propaganda im politischen Spektrum? und wie wird Propaganda in politischen Foren aufgenommen?', 'bg': 'Политическите дискусии се въртят около идеологически конфликти, които често разделят публиката на две противоположни партии. И двете страни се опитват да спечелят аргумента, като представят информация. Често обаче тази информация е подвеждаща и разпространението й използва пропагандни техники. В тази работа анализираме въздействието на пропагандата върху шест основни политически форума в Редит, насочени към разнообразна аудитория в две страни, САЩ и Великобритания. Фокусираме се върху три изследователски въпроса: кой публикува пропаганда? Как пропагандата се различава в политическия спектър? и как се приема пропагандата на политическите форуми?', 'hr': 'Politički raspravi se okreću oko ideoloških sukoba koji često podijele publiku u dvije suprotne stranke. Obje strane pokušavaju osvojiti argument donošenjem informacija. Međutim, često je ova informacija pogrešna, a njegova širenja koristi propagandne tehnike. U ovom poslu analiziramo utjecaj propagande na šest glavnih političkih foruma na Reddit koji cilja različitim publikom u dvije zemlje, SAD i UK. Fokusiramo se na tri istraživanja: tko postavlja propagandu? Kako se propaganda razlikuje u političkom spektru? i kako se propaganda prima na političkim forumima?', 'id': 'Diskusi politik berbalik sekitar konflik ideologi yang sering membagi penonton menjadi dua pihak lawan. Kedua pihak mencoba untuk memenangkan argumen dengan membawa informasi. Namun, sering informasi ini menyesatkan, dan penyebarannya menggunakan teknik propaganda. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami menganalisis dampak propaganda pada enam forum politik utama di Reddit yang menargetkan penonton yang berbeda di dua negara, AS dan Inggris. Kita fokus pada tiga pertanyaan penelitian: siapa yang memposting propaganda? bagaimana propaganda berbeda di seluruh spektrum politik? dan bagaimana propaganda diterima di forum politik?', 'sw': 'Mjadala wa kisiasa huvunjika katika migogoro ya kiitikadi ambayo mara nyingi hugawanya hadhira kuwa vyama viwili vinavyopinga. Vyama hivyo viwili vinjaribu kushinda hoja kwa kutoa taarifa. Hata hivyo, mara nyingi taarifa hii inapotosha, na usambazaji wake unatumia mbinu za propaganda. Katika kazi hii, tunachambua athari ya propaganda juu ya jukwaa sita kubwa la kisiasa kwenye Reddit ambalo linalenga hadhira tofauti katika nchi mbili, Marekani na Uingereza. Tunakatiza maswali matatu ya utafiti: Nani anaposti propaganda? propaganda inatofautiana na mtazamo wa kisiasa? na propaganda vipi inapokea kwenye majukwaa ya kisiasa?', 'ko': '정치 토론은 이데올로기 충돌을 둘러싸고 전개되는데 이런 충돌은 종종 관중을 두 개의 대립된 당파로 나눈다.양측 모두 정보 제공을 통해 논쟁을 얻으려고 시도했다.그러나 이런 정보는 종종 오도성을 가지기 때문에 그 전파는 홍보 수단을 채택했다.이 작업에서 우리는 홍보가 Reddit 6대 정치 포럼에 미친 영향을 분석했는데 이런 포럼은 미국과 영국 두 나라의 서로 다른 관중을 대상으로 한다.우리는 세 가지 연구 문제에 주목한다. 누가 홍보를 발표하고 있습니까?서로 다른 정치파의 선전은 어떤 차이가 있습니까?정치 논단의 선전은 어떻게 받아들였습니까?', 'fa': 'بحث سیاسی در اطراف اختلاف ایده\u200cشناسی که اغلب تماشاگران را به دو حزب مخالف تقسیم می\u200cکنند. هر دو گروهی سعی می کنند با پیشرفت اطلاعات پیروز کنند. با این حال، اغلب این اطلاعات اشتباه می\u200cکند و تقسیم آن تکنیک\u200cهای پراپاگاندی را استفاده می\u200cکند. در این کار، ما تاثیر پروپاگاندا را بر شش فرموم سیاسی بزرگ روی ردیدت تحلیل می کنیم که در دو کشور، ایالات متحده و انگلیسی هدف یک تماشاگر مختلف را هدف می دهد. ما روی سه سوال تحقیقات تمرکز می کنیم: کیست که پروپاگاندا را بفرسته؟ چگونه پروپاگاندا در طبقه سیاسی تفاوت می\u200cکند؟ و چگونه پروپاگاندا در فرموم سیاسی دریافت می شود؟', 'tr': "Syýasy gürrüňler ideolojik çaganlarda köplenç publikasyny iki garşy tarapyna bölýärler. Her iki parti de öne bilgi getirerek argümanı kazanmaya çalışıyor. Ýöne köplenç bu maglumat ýalňyşlyk ýok bolýar we açylyk propaganda teknikleri ulanýar. Bu işde biz Reddit'a 6 sany möhüm syýasy forumlarda propaganda etkiniň täsirini analyzýarys. Bu iki ýurtda, ABŞ we Britaniýada dürli publikalaryň netijesi bar. Üç araşdyrma soragyna üns berýäris: kim propaganda goýýar? Propaganda siyasi spektrumda nädip farklı? we syýasy forumlarda propaganda nädip aldylýar?", 'af': "Politiese diskusies rondom ideologiese konflikte wat dikwels die publiek in twee teenstelende partye verdeel. Beide partye probeer om die argument te wen deur vorentoe inligting te bring. Maar dikwels is hierdie inligting verkeerd, en sy verspreiding gebruik propagande teknike. In hierdie werk, ons analyseer die effek van propaganda op ses groot politieke forums op Reddit wat 'n verskeie publikaat in twee lande, die VSA en die VK doen. Ons fokus op drie ondersoek vrae: wie stuur propaganda? hoe is propaganda verskillend oor die politieke spektrum? en hoe is propaganda ontvang op politieke forums?", 'sq': 'Diskutimet politike rrotullohen rreth konflikteve ideologjike që shpesh ndajnë publikun në dy partitë kundërshtare. Të dy palët përpiqen të fitojnë argumentin duke sjellë informacion përpara. Megjithatë, shpesh ky informacion është mashtrues dhe përhapja e tij përdor teknika propagande. Në këtë punë, ne analizojmë ndikimin e propagandës në gjashtë forume të mëdha politike mbi Reddit që synojnë një audiencë të ndryshme në dy vende, SHBA dhe MB. Ne përqëndrohemi në tre pyetje kërkimi: kush po publikon propagandë? how does propaganda differ across the political spectrum?  dhe si merret propaganda në forumet politike?', 'hy': 'Քաղաքական քննարկումները պտտվում են գաղափարաբանական հակամարտությունների շուրջ, որոնք հաճախ բաժանում են հանդիսատեսին երկու հակառակ կողմերի: Երկու մասնակիցները փորձում են հաղթել բանավեճը տեղեկատվության առաջացման միջոցով: Այնուամենայնիվ, հաճախ այս տեղեկատվությունը մոլորեցնող է, և դրա տարածումը օգտագործում է պրոպագանդային մեթոդներ: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք վերլուծում ենք պրոպագանդայի ազդեցությունը վեց կարևոր քաղաքական ֆորմում Reddit-ի վրա, որոնք նպատակում են բազմազան հանդիսատես երկու երկրներում՝ ԱՄՆ-ում և Մեծ Բրիտանիայում: Մենք կենտրոնանում ենք երեք հետազոտության հարցերի վրա. ո՞վ է պրոպագանդան տեղադրում: ինչպե՞ս է պրոպագանդան տարբերվում քաղաքական սպեկտրի մեջ: և ինչպե՞ս է քաղաքական ֆորմում ընդունվում քարոզարշավը:', 'bn': 'রাজনৈতিক আলোচনা প্রায়শই দুই বিরোধী দলের মধ্যে প্রতিযোগিতা প্রকাশ করে। উভয় দল তথ্য প্রদান করে যুক্তি জিতে চেষ্টা করে। তবে প্রায়শই এই তথ্য বিভ্রান্ত হচ্ছে এবং এর প্রচারণা প্রচারণা কৌশল কাজ করছে। এই কাজে আমরা প্রচারণা ছয় প্রধান রাজনৈতিক ফোরামের উপর প্রভাব বিশ্লেষণ করি যা দুই দেশ, যুক্তরাষ্ট্র এবং যুক্তরাজ্যের বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন শ্ আমরা তিনটি গবেষণার প্রশ্নের উপর মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি: কে প্রচারণা পোস্ট করছে? রাজনৈতিক দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিতে প্রচারণা কিভাবে ভিন্ন? এবং কিভাবে রাজনৈতিক ফোরামে প্রচারণা পেয়েছে?', 'az': "Siyasi müzakirələr ideolojik münafiqlərin ətrafında çəkilir ki, insanları sık-sık iki münafiq partiyə bölüşdür. İki dəstək arqüməni öndə bilgi gətirərək qələbə çatmağa çalışır. Ancaq bu məlumat çox dəyişiklikdir və yayılması propaganda teknikləri istifadə edir. Bu işdə, Reddit'in altı böyük siyasi forumların propagandanın etkisini analiz edirik ki, iki ülkedə, ABŞ və İngiltere müxtəlif seyircilərə nişan verir. Üç araştırma suallarına odaklanırıq: propaganda kimdir? propaganda siyasi spektrumda necə fərqli olar? və siyasi forumlarda propaganda necə alındı?", 'bs': 'Političke diskusije se okreću oko ideoloških sukoba koji često podijele publiku u dvije suprotne stranke. Obje strane pokušavaju osvojiti argument donošenjem informacija. Međutim, često je ova informacija pogrešna, a širenje koristi propagandne tehnike. U ovom poslu analiziramo utjecaj propagande na šest glavnih političkih foruma na Reddit koji cilja različitim publikom u dvije zemlje, SAD i UK. Fokusiramo se na tri istraživanja: ko postavlja propagandu? Kako se propaganda razlikuje u političkom spektru? i kako se propaganda prima na političkim forumima?', 'am': 'የፖለቲካ ውይይቶች ብዙ ጊዜ ሰዎቹን ወደ ተቃዋሚዎች ሁለት ተቃዋሚዎች የሚሆኑ የአሳባቢ ግጭት ውስጥ ይዋረዳሉ፡፡ ሁለቱም ተጋሪዎች መረጃ በማስጠጋት ክርክሩን ለማግኘት ይፈልጋሉ፡፡ ነገር ግን ብዙ ጊዜ ይህ መረጃ ያሳስታል፣ የዘረፋውም የpropaganda ቴክኖስን ያስተካክላል፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ ውስጥ በሁለት አገሮች፣ አሜሪካ እና አሜሪካ እና አግሪካ ያሉትን የስድስት ትልቁ ፖለቲካዊ ጦማሮች ላይ የፖለቲካ ውጤቶች የሚያስተምር እናደርጋለን፡፡ የሦስት ምርመራ ጥያቄዎች ላይ እናስከትናለን፤ የፕሮፓጋንዳ ማን ነው? የፖለቲካ ጉዳይ እንዴት ይለያያል? የፖለቲካ መድረክ እንዴት ተቀብለዋል?', 'ca': "Els debats polítics giren al voltant dels conflictes ideològics que sovint divideixen l'audiència en dos partits oposats. Ambdues partides intenten guanyar l'argument presentant informació. Però sovint aquesta informació és enganyadora, i la seva disseminació utilitza tècniques de propaganda. En aquest treball, analitzem l'impacte de la propaganda en sis fòrums polítics importants en Reddit que s'apunten a una audiència diversa de dos països, els Estats Units i el Regne Unit. Ens centrem en tres preguntes de recerca: qui està publicant propaganda? com difereix la propaganda a l'espectre polític? i com es rep la propaganda als fòrums polítics?", 'cs': 'Politické diskuse se točí kolem ideologických konfliktů, které často rozdělují diváky na dvě protichůdné strany. Obě strany se snaží argument vyhrát předložením informací. Často jsou však tyto informace zavádějící a jejich šíření využívá propagandistické techniky. V této práci analyzujeme dopad propagandy na šesti hlavních politických fórech na Redditu, která se zaměřují na různorodé publikum ve dvou zemích, USA a Velké Británii. Zaměřujeme se na tři výzkumné otázky: kdo publikuje propagandu? Jak se propaganda liší napříč politickým spektrem? a jak je propaganda přijímána na politických fórech?', 'et': 'Poliitilised arutelud keerlevad ideoloogiliste konfliktide ümber, mis sageli jagavad publiku kaheks vastaspooleks. Mõlemad pooled püüavad argumenti võita, esitades teavet. Sageli on see teave eksitav ja selle levitamine kasutab propagandameetodeid. Selles töös analüüsime propaganda mõju kuuele Redditi poliitilisele foorumile, mis on suunatud mitmekesisele publikule kahes riigis, USAs ja Ühendkuningriigis. Keskendume kolmele uurimisküsimusele: kes postitab propagandat? Kuidas erineb propaganda poliitilises spektris? ja kuidas võetakse propaganda vastu poliitilistel foorumitel?', 'fi': 'Poliittiset keskustelut keskittyvät ideologisiin konflikteihin, jotka usein jakavat yleisön kahteen vastakkaiseen puolueeseen. Molemmat osapuolet yrittävät voittaa väitteen esittämällä tietoja. Usein tämä tieto on kuitenkin harhaanjohtavaa, ja sen levittäminen käyttää propagandatekniikoita. Tässä työssä analysoimme propagandan vaikutusta kuudelle Reddit-foorumille, jotka ovat suunnattu monipuoliselle yleisölle kahdessa maassa, Yhdysvalloissa ja Isossa-Britanniassa. Keskitymme kolmeen tutkimuskysymykseen: kuka julkaisee propagandaa? Miten propaganda eroaa poliittisesti? Miten propagandaa otetaan vastaan poliittisilla foorumeilla?', 'he': 'דיון פוליטי מסתובב מסביב לקונפלקטים אידיאולוגיים שלעתים קרובות מחלקים את הקהל לשני מסיבות מתנגדות. שני המפלגות מנסים לנצח בטעון על ידי להביא מידע. בכל אופן, לעתים קרובות המידע הזה מושג, והפיתוח שלו משתמש בטכניקות propaganda. In this work, we analyze the impact of propaganda on six major political forums on Reddit that target a diverse audience in two countries, the US and the UK.  אנחנו מתמקדים בשלושה שאלות מחקרים: מי פורסם פרופגנדה? איך הפרוגנדה שונה ברחבי הספקטרום הפוליטי? ואיך התגלות מקבלת בפורומים פוליטיים?', 'ha': "Haƙĩƙa masu sihiri na fara a tsakanin muran fikayaiki da ake gaura saurãren zuwa ƙungiya biyu masu motsi. Kuma ƙungiyõyi biyu sun yi nufin su rinjãya da jãyayya a cikin gaugar. Kayya, ko da yawa wannan information yana ɓatarwa, kuma fassararsa yana amfani da kunnufi. Daga wannan aikin, Munã yi anayya ga fassarar bayani a kan jama'a 6 masu muhimmi na siasa a kan RedRededit, wanda ke ƙayyade saurãre masu yawa a cikin mataifa biyu, Marekani da UK. Tuna kiyãye masu tambayi uku: Wãne ne ke poster bayani? Yãye ne aganda ke sãɓã a tsakanin siasa? kuma yadda aka karɓi aganda a kan jama'a siyasa?", 'sk': 'Politične razprave se vrtijo okoli ideoloških konfliktov, ki pogosto razdelijo občinstvo na dve nasprotujoči stranki. Obe strani poskušata zmagati argument s predložitvijo informacij. Vendar so te informacije pogosto zavajajoče in njihovo razširjanje uporablja propagandne tehnike. V tem delu analiziramo vpliv propagande na šest glavnih političnih forumov na Reddit, ki so usmerjeni v različno publiko v dveh državah, ZDA in Združeno kraljestvo. Osredotočamo se na tri raziskovalna vprašanja: kdo objavlja propagando? Kako se propaganda razlikuje po političnem spektru? in kako se propaganda sprejema na političnih forumih?', 'jv': 'Rasané politik sing katol-katolan winih sing dikarepaké awak dhéwé éntukno Publikum iki bakal sing nguasai winih. Festival default voice Drongen, dino-ngopo informasi iki dadi ora popolakno, lan piyang dipugangan ngono teknik pakan bangsane. Nang gunggo iki, awak dhéwé énjelisaké éntuk ning awak dhéwé sing bakal ning limo perbudhakan politik sing nyelarani ning Redit kuwi iki bakal terus kanggo klebu perkaraan sampeyan kanggo didasai winih dhéwé, Merak Uni karo Nggilika sing dumadhi Awakdhéwé mengko karo telu saiki perusahaan: piye iso ngubah perusahaan? Piye nganggo tresno-tresno sing mengko ajeng-ajeng politik ? lan piye ngerti, opo dipunangé kuwi ngéwé ning acara politik ?', 'bo': 'ཆབ་སྲིད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་འདེམས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གྱི་གནད་དོན་གང་དུ་འགྲོ་བཞིན་ཡོད། Both parties are trying to win the argument by bringing forward information. ཡིན་ནའང་། རྒྱུན་ལྡན་དེ་གནས་ཚུལ་འདི་ནོར་སྐྱོན་མེད་ཐུབ་པ་དང་། ཞིབ་བཤེར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་ཨ་རིར་དང་ཨིན་རིའི་ནང་དུ་རྣམས་ལྟ་སྟངས་གདོང་འགོད་པའི་ཆབ་སྲིད་གཞུང་གི་གནད་དོན་༦ ང་ཚོས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་འདྲི་ཚིག་གསུམ་ལ་གནད་དོན་དགོས་མིན། གསལ་རྗེས་གང་ཞིག་བྱེད་དོ་ཡ སྲོལ་སྒྲིག་གི་མི་འདྲ་བའི་གྲངས་ཀ་དེ་ཇི་ལྟར་འགྱུར་བ་དང་། ཆབ་སྲིད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་འདྲ་ཐོག་ཏེ།'}
{'en': 'Probing for idiomaticity in vector space models', 'ar': 'البحث عن الاصطلاح في نماذج الفضاء المتجه', 'fr': "Sondage de l'idiomatique dans les modèles spatiaux vectoriels", 'es': 'Sondeo de idiomaticidad en modelos de espacio vectorial', 'pt': 'Como pesquisar idiomaticidade em modelos de espaço vetorial', 'ja': 'ベクトル空間モデルにおける造語性の探求', 'ru': 'Зондирование идиоматичности в моделях векторного пространства', 'zh': '探向量空中习语', 'hi': 'वेक्टर अंतरिक्ष मॉडल में मुहावरेदारी के लिए जांच', 'ga': 'Iniúchadh ar ghnásúlacht i samhlacha spáis veicteora', 'ka': 'თეთჲმართფვჟკარა ოპჲბლვმა გ გვკრჲპ კჲჟმჲჟ მჲევლთრვ.', 'el': 'Έλεγχος ιδιομορφίας σε διανυσματικά διαστημικά μοντέλα', 'hu': 'Idiomatikusság vizsgálata vektortérmodellekben', 'it': "Analisi dell'idiomaticità nei modelli spaziali vettoriali", 'kk': 'Вектор бос орын үлгілерінде идеоматикалықты тексеру', 'mk': 'Истражување за идиоматичност во векторните вселенски модели', 'lt': 'Tyrimas dėl idiomatiškumo vektorių kosmoso modeliuose', 'ms': 'Probing for idiomaticity in vector space models', 'ml': 'Probing for idiomaticity in vector space models', 'mt': 'Probar għall-idjomatiċità fil-mudelli tal-ispazju tal-vetturi', 'mn': 'Вектор орон зайн загварын идэвхтэй байдлыг судалж,', 'ro': 'Proiectarea idiomaticității în modelele spațiale vectoriale', 'pl': 'Badanie idiomatyczności w modelach wektorowych przestrzeni', 'no': 'Prøver for idiomatiket i vektorrommodeller', 'sr': 'Proba za idiomatiènost u vektorskim svemirskim modelima', 'sv': 'Undersökning av idiomatik i vektorrymdsmodeller', 'ur': 'ویکتور فضا موڈل میں سمجھانے کے لئے آزمائش کی جاتی ہے', 'ta': 'வெக்டர் வெக்டார் இடைவெளி மாதிரிகளில் முட்டாள்திறனுக்கான முன்னோட்டம்', 'so': 'Ku baaraandegista idiomnimada samooyinka wadooyinka', 'si': 'වෙක්ටර් අකාශ මෝඩල් වල මෝඩල් විදියට පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phát âm tính biểu tượng trong mô- đun vector', 'da': 'Undersøgelse af idiomatik i vektorrumsmodeller', 'nl': 'Onderzoek naar idiomatica in vectorruimtemodellen', 'bg': 'Пробване за идиоматичност във векторни пространствени модели', 'hr': 'Proba za idiomatičnost u vektorskim svemirskim modelima', 'ko': '벡터 공간 모델에서의 관용성 연구', 'de': 'Suche nach Idiomatizität in Vektorraummodellen', 'id': 'Probing for idiomaticity in vector space models', 'fa': 'امتحان کردن برای احمقانه در مدل فضای ویکتور', 'sw': 'Kujaribu upumbavu katika mifano ya anga', 'tr': 'Vektör alan modellerinde matematik testi', 'af': 'Probeer vir idiomatisie in vektor spasiemodelle', 'sq': 'Duke provuar për idiomatikën në modelet e hapësirës vectore', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'az': 'Vektor kosmosu modell…ôrind…ô idiomatik t…ô≈üviq etm…ôk', 'hy': 'Վեկտոր տիեզերական մոդելների իմաստալիության փորձը', 'bn': 'ভেক্টরের স্পেস মডেলে নির্বোধের জন্য প্রস্তুত করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Proba za idiomatičnost u vektorskim svemirskim modelima', 'ca': 'Probar la idiomàtica en els models espacials vectors', 'cs': 'Snímání idiomatiky ve vektorových prostorových modelech', 'et': 'Vektorruumi mudelite idiomaatsuse uurimine', 'fi': 'Idiomaattisuuden kartoittaminen vektoriavaruuden malleissa', 'ha': 'Yi jarraba wa diodetici cikin misalin fili na hanya', 'sk': 'Preverjanje idiomatičnosti v modelih vektorskega prostora', 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop', 'he': 'ניסיון לאידיומטיות בדוגמני חלל ווקטורים', 'bo': 'ཚག་བར་སྟོང་གི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ནང་གི་འགྱུར་བ་དག་ལ་བལྟ་བྱེད་དགོས་པ'}
{'en': 'Contextualised word representation models have been successfully used for capturing different word usages and they may be an attractive alternative for representing idiomaticity in language. In this paper, we propose probing measures to assess if some of the expected linguistic properties of noun compounds, especially those related to idiomatic meanings, and their dependence on context and sensitivity to lexical choice, are readily available in some standard and widely used representations. For that, we constructed the Noun Compound Senses Dataset, which contains noun compounds and their paraphrases, in context neutral and context informative naturalistic sentences, in two languages : English and Portuguese. Results obtained using four types of probing measures with models like ELMo, BERT and some of its variants, indicate that idiomaticity is not yet accurately represented by contextualised models', 'ar': 'تم استخدام نماذج تمثيل الكلمات السياقية بنجاح لالتقاط استخدامات مختلفة للكلمات وقد تكون بديلاً جذابًا لتمثيل الاصطلاحات في اللغة. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح تدابير استقصائية لتقييم ما إذا كانت بعض الخصائص اللغوية المتوقعة لمركبات الأسماء ، خاصة تلك المتعلقة بالمعاني الاصطلاحية ، واعتمادها على السياق والحساسية للاختيار المعجمي ، متاحة بسهولة في بعض التمثيلات القياسية والمستخدمة على نطاق واسع. لذلك ، قمنا ببناء مجموعة بيانات Noun Compound Senses ، التي تحتوي على مركبات الأسماء وإعادة صياغتها ، في سياق جمل طبيعية إعلامية محايدة وسياق ، بلغتين: الإنجليزية والبرتغالية. النتائج التي تم الحصول عليها باستخدام أربعة أنواع من مقاييس التحقيق مع نماذج مثل ELMo و BERT وبعض متغيراتها ، تشير إلى أن الاصطلاح لم يتم تمثيله بدقة من خلال النماذج السياقية', 'fr': "Les modèles de représentation textuelle des mots ont été utilisés avec succès pour saisir différents usages des mots et peuvent constituer une alternative intéressante pour représenter l'idiomatique dans le langage. Dans cet article, nous proposons des mesures de sondage pour évaluer si certaines des propriétés linguistiques attendues des composés nominaux, en particulier celles liées aux significations idiomatiques, ainsi que leur dépendance au contexte et leur sensibilité au choix lexical, sont facilement disponibles dans certaines représentations standard et largement utilisées. Pour cela, nous avons construit le jeu de données Noun Compound Senses, qui contient des composés nominaux et leurs paraphrases, dans des phrases naturalistes informatives de contexte et informatives, en deux langues\xa0: anglais et portugais. Les résultats obtenus à l'aide de quatre types de mesures de sondage avec des modèles tels que ElMo, BERT et certaines de ses variantes indiquent que l'idiomatique n'est pas encore représentée avec précision par les modèles contextualisés", 'es': 'Los modelos de representación de palabras contextualizados se han utilizado con éxito para capturar diferentes usos de palabras y pueden ser una alternativa atractiva para representar la idiomaticidad en el lenguaje. En este artículo, proponemos medidas de sondeo para evaluar si algunas de las propiedades lingüísticas esperadas de los compuestos nominales, especialmente las relacionadas con los significados idiomáticos, y su dependencia del contexto y la sensibilidad a la elección léxica, están fácilmente disponibles en algunas representaciones estándar y ampliamente utilizadas. Para ello, construimos el Noun Compound Senses Dataset, que contiene compuestos nominales y sus paráfrasis, en oraciones naturalistas de contexto neutro e informativas de contexto, en dos idiomas: inglés y portugués. Los resultados obtenidos utilizando cuatro tipos de medidas de sondeo con modelos como ELmo, BERT y algunas de sus variantes, indican que la idiomaticidad aún no está representada con precisión por los modelos contextualizados', 'pt': 'Modelos contextualizados de representação de palavras têm sido usados com sucesso para capturar diferentes usos de palavras e podem ser uma alternativa atraente para representar a idiomaticidade na linguagem. Neste artigo, propomos medidas de sondagem para avaliar se algumas das propriedades linguísticas esperadas de compostos nominais, especialmente aquelas relacionadas a significados idiomáticos, e sua dependência do contexto e sensibilidade à escolha lexical, estão prontamente disponíveis em algumas representações padrão e amplamente utilizadas. Para isso, construímos o Noun Compound Senses Dataset, que contém compostos nominais e suas paráfrases, em sentenças naturalísticas neutras de contexto e informativas de contexto, em dois idiomas: inglês e português. Resultados obtidos usando quatro tipos de medidas de sondagem com modelos como ELMo, BERT e algumas de suas variantes, indicam que a idiomaticidade ainda não é representada com precisão por modelos contextualizados', 'ja': '文脈化された単語表現モデルは、異なる単語の使用をキャプチャするために成功裏に使用されており、それらは、言語における造語性を表現するための魅力的な代替案であり得る。この論文では、名詞化合物の予想される言語的特性のいくつか、特に造語的意味に関連するもの、および文脈への依存性、および語彙的選択に対する感受性が、いくつかの標準的で広く使用されている表現で容易に利用可能であるかどうかを評価するための探索尺度を提案する。そのために、私たちは名詞化合物とそのパラフレーズを含む名詞化合物感覚データセットを構築しました。文脈中立的で文脈情報的な自然主義文で、英語とポルトガル語の2つの言語で行われます。ELMo、BERT、およびそのバリアントのいくつかなどのモデルを用いた4種類のプローブメジャーを用いて得られた結果は、文脈化されたモデルによって造語性がまだ正確に表現されていないことを示している。', 'zh': '上下文化之单词,模形已成,所以异单词用法者,或言习语有吸引力代方也。 凡探事以质名词化合物期言性,特关习语义之性,上下文赖词汇之敏感性,随时施用。 为构名词复合感官数据集,其包名词复合及其释义,于上下文中性且上下文信息自然主义句,用二语:英语、葡萄牙语。 以四者得之,ELMoBERT及其变体,言未形也', 'hi': 'प्रासंगिक शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व मॉडल का उपयोग विभिन्न शब्द उपयोगों को कैप्चर करने के लिए सफलतापूर्वक किया गया है और वे भाषा में मुहावरेदारी का प्रतिनिधित्व करने के लिए एक आकर्षक विकल्प हो सकते हैं। इस पत्र में, हम यह आकलन करने के लिए जांच उपायों का प्रस्ताव करते हैं कि क्या संज्ञा यौगिकों के कुछ अपेक्षित भाषाई गुण, विशेष रूप से मुहावरेदार अर्थों से संबंधित, और संदर्भ और लेक्सिकल पसंद के प्रति संवेदनशीलता पर उनकी निर्भरता, कुछ मानक और व्यापक रूप से उपयोग किए जाने वाले प्रतिनिधित्वों में आसानी से उपलब्ध हैं। इसके लिए, हमने संज्ञा यौगिक इंद्रियों डेटासेट का निर्माण किया, जिसमें संज्ञा यौगिक और उनके पैराफ्रेज़ शामिल हैं, संदर्भ तटस्थ और संदर्भ में जानकारीपूर्ण प्राकृतिक वाक्यों में, दो भाषाओं में: अंग्रेजी और पुर्तगाली। ELMo, BERT और इसके कुछ वेरिएंट जैसे मॉडल के साथ चार प्रकार के जांच उपायों का उपयोग करके प्राप्त परिणाम, इंगित करते हैं कि मुहावरेदारता अभी तक प्रासंगिक मॉडल द्वारा सटीक रूप से प्रतिनिधित्व नहीं किया गया है', 'ru': 'Контекстуализированные модели представления слов были успешно использованы для захвата различных видов использования слов, и они могут быть привлекательной альтернативой для представления идиоматичности в языке. В этой статье мы предлагаем зондирующие меры для оценки того, являются ли некоторые ожидаемые лингвистические свойства соединений существительных, особенно те, которые связаны с идиоматическими значениями, и их зависимость от контекста и чувствительность к лексическому выбору, легкодоступными в некоторых стандартных и широко используемых представлениях. Для этого мы построили на двух языках: английском и португальском - набор данных о составных существительных, содержащий составные существительные и их перефразы, в контексте нейтральных и контекстно-информативных натуралистических предложений. Результаты, полученные с использованием четырех типов зондирующих измерений с такими моделями, как ELMO, BERT и некоторые из его вариантов, показывают, что идиоматичность еще не точно представлена контекстуализированными моделями', 'ga': 'Baineadh úsáid rathúil as samhlacha comhthéacsaithe ionadaíochta focal chun úsáidí éagsúla focal a ghabháil agus d’fhéadfaidís a bheith ina rogha malartach tarraingteach chun gnásanna teanga a léiriú. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid bearta iniúchta le fáil amach an bhfuil cuid de na hairíonna teangeolaíocha a mbeifí ag súil leo i gcomhdhúile ainmfhocail, go háirithe iad siúd a bhaineann le bríonna gnásúla, agus a spleáchas ar chomhthéacs agus íogaireacht do rogha foclóireachta, ar fáil go héasca i roinnt léirithe caighdeánacha agus a úsáidtear go forleathan. Ar an ábhar sin, rinneamar Tacar Sonraí na nAinmhithe Comhdhúile Ainmfhocail, ina bhfuil comhdhúile ainmfhocail agus a gcuid parafrámaí, i gcomhthéacs neodrach agus abairtí nádúraíoch faisnéiseach i gcomhthéacs, in dhá theanga: Béarla agus Portaingéilis. Léiríonn torthaí a fuarthas agus úsáid á baint as ceithre chineál beart taiscéalaíochta le samhlacha cosúil le ELMo, BERT agus roinnt dá leagan, nach bhfuil na gnáthréimsí léirithe go cruinn fós ag samhlacha comhthéacsúla', 'ka': 'კონტექსტუალურებული სიტყვის გამოყენება მოდელები წარმატებით გამოყენებულია განსხვავებული სიტყვის გამოყენებისთვის და ისინი შეიძლება იყოს ატრაქტიური ალტექტურატი ენაში ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ მინდომებით პრობენტის მიზეზები, რომელიც წარმოიდგინეთ სიმბოლობის განსაზღვრებული სიმბოლობის განსაზღვრებულები, განსაზღვრებით იდეომატიკური მიზეზებისთვის, და მათი განსაზღვრებულობა კონტექ ამისთვის, ჩვენ შევქმნით ახალგაზრული კომპუნეტის მონაცემების მონაცემები, რომელიც ახალგაზრული კომპუნეტი და მათი პარაფრაზების შესახებ, კონტექსტური და კონტექსტური ინფორ წარმოდგენები, რომლებიც ELMo, BERT და რამდენიმე განრამეტრებებით გამოყენებული ოთხი ტიპი პრობლემების მოწყობილობის გამოყენება, იდეომატიკური მოდელები არ არის კონტექსტულიზულებული მოდელები', 'hu': 'A kontextualizált szóreprezentációs modelleket sikeresen használták a különböző szóhasználatok rögzítésére, és vonzó alternatívát jelenthetnek az idiomatikusság nyelvi ábrázolására. Jelen tanulmányban vizsgálati intézkedéseket javasolunk annak értékelésére, hogy a főnévvegyületek várható nyelvi tulajdonságai, különösen az idiomatikus jelentésekhez kapcsolódók, valamint a kontextustól való függésük és a lexikai választásra való érzékenységük könnyen elérhetőek-e néhány standard és széles körben használt reprezentációban. Ehhez megépítettük a Főnévösszetétel érzékek adatkészletét, amely főnévösszetételeket és parafrázisaikat tartalmazza kontextussemleges és kontextusinformációs naturalista mondatokban, két nyelven: angolul és portugálul. Az ELMo, BERT és néhány változata esetén négyféle mérési méréssel kapott eredmények arra utalnak, hogy a kontextuális modellek még nem pontosan reprezentálják az idiomatikát.', 'el': 'Τα μοντέλα αναπαράστασης λέξεων έχουν χρησιμοποιηθεί με επιτυχία για την καταγραφή διαφορετικών χρήσεων λέξεων και μπορεί να αποτελέσουν μια ελκυστική εναλλακτική λύση για την αναπαράσταση της ιδιομορφίας στη γλώσσα. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε διερευνητικά μέτρα για να αξιολογηθεί αν ορισμένες από τις αναμενόμενες γλωσσικές ιδιότητες των ουσιαστικών ενώσεων, ειδικά εκείνες που σχετίζονται με τις ιδιοματικές έννοιες, και η εξάρτησή τους από το πλαίσιο και την ευαισθησία στην λεξική επιλογή, είναι άμεσα διαθέσιμες σε ορισμένες τυποποιημένες και ευρέως χρησιμοποιούμενες αναπαραστάσεις. Για αυτό, κατασκευάσαμε το σύνολο δεδομένων για τις αισθήσεις ουσιαστικών, το οποίο περιέχει ενώσεις ουσιαστικών και τις παραφράσεις τους, σε ουδέτερες και ενημερωτικές φυσιογραφικές προτάσεις, σε δύο γλώσσες: Αγγλικά και Πορτογαλικά. Τα αποτελέσματα που ελήφθησαν με τη χρήση τεσσάρων τύπων μετρήσεων ανίχνευσης με μοντέλα όπως ELMo, BERT και ορισμένες από τις παραλλαγές του, δείχνουν ότι η ιδιομορφία δεν αναπαρίσταται ακόμη με ακρίβεια από μοντέλα πλαισιωμένα', 'kk': 'Контекстуалды сөздерді көрсету үлгілері басқа сөздерді алу үшін сәтті қолданылды. Олар тілде идиоматикалықты көрсету альтернативі болуы мүмкін. Бұл қағазда, мәліметтердің күтпеген лингвистикалық қасиеттерінің, осылай-ақ идеоматикалық мәліметтеріне сәйкес келген, контексті және лексикалық таңдау тәуелсіздігіне тәуелдік тәуелсіздігін оңай және көбірек қолданыл Бұл үшін біз Ағылшын және парафразтарының атаулық тіліктері мен мәліметті натуралистик сөйлемелерді екі тілде құрылдық. Ағылшын және португалық тілде. ELMo, BERT және оның кейбір варианттары секілді төрт түрлерінің сынақтау мерзімдерін қолдану нәтижелері, идеоматикалық әлі контекстуалды үлгілер арқылы дұрыс көрсетілмегенін көрсетеді.', 'it': "I modelli contestualizzati di rappresentazione delle parole sono stati utilizzati con successo per catturare diversi usi delle parole e possono essere un'alternativa interessante per rappresentare l'idiomaticità nel linguaggio. In questo articolo, proponiamo misure sondanti per valutare se alcune delle proprietà linguistiche attese dei composti sostantivi, in particolare quelle relative ai significati idiomatici, e la loro dipendenza dal contesto e sensibilità alla scelta lessicale, sono prontamente disponibili in alcune rappresentazioni standard e ampiamente utilizzate. Per questo abbiamo costruito il dataset dei sensi composti di sostantivi, che contiene composti di sostantivi e le loro parafrasi, in frasi naturalistiche neutre e informative contestuali, in due lingue: inglese e portoghese. I risultati ottenuti utilizzando quattro tipi di misure di sonda con modelli come ELMo, BERT e alcune delle sue varianti indicano che l'idiomaticità non è ancora rappresentata con precisione da modelli contestualizzati", 'lt': 'Konkstualizuoti žodžių reprezentacijos modeliai buvo sėkmingai naudojami įvairiems žodžių naudojimo būdams capturuoti ir jie gali būti patraukli alternatyva idiomatiškumui kalboje reprezentuoti. Šiame dokumente siūlome ištirti priemones, siekiant įvertinti, ar kai kurios tikėtinos kalbinės vardinių junginių savybės, ypač tos, kurios susijusios su idiomatinėmis reikšmėmis, ir jų priklausomybė nuo konteksto ir jautrumo leksiniam pasirinkimui, yra lengvai prieinamos kai kuriuose standartiniuose ir plačiai naudojamuose vaizduose. Tuo tikslu sukūrėme duomenų rinkinį, kuriame yra vardinių junginių ir jų parafrazių, neutralių kontekstų ir kontekstų informacinių natūralių sakinių, dviem kalbomis: anglų ir portugalų. Rezultatai, gauti naudojant keturių rūšių zondų matavimo priemones su modeliais, pavyzdžiui, ELMo, BERT ir kai kuriais jo variantais, rodo, kad idiomatiškumas dar nėra tiksliai atspindėtas kontekstiniais modeliais.', 'ms': 'Contextualised word representation models have been successfully used for capturing different word usages and they may be an attractive alternative for representing idiomaticity in language.  Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan tindakan pengujian untuk menilai jika sebahagian dari ciri-ciri bahasa yang dijangka bagi komponen nama, terutama yang berkaitan dengan makna idiomatik, dan dependensi mereka pada konteks dan sensitiviti kepada pilihan leksik, mudah tersedia dalam beberapa perwakilan piawai dan luas digunakan. Untuk itu, kami membina Dataset Senses Komponen Nama, yang mengandungi komponen nama dan parafrasa mereka, dalam konteks neutral dan konteks kalimat informatif alam, dalam dua bahasa: Bahasa Inggeris dan Portugis. Keputusan yang dicapai menggunakan empat jenis tindakan pengujian dengan model seperti ELMo, BERT dan sebahagian varian, menunjukkan bahawa idiomatik masih tidak mewakili dengan tepat oleh model kontekstualisasi', 'mk': 'Контекстуалните модели на претставување на зборови се успешно употребени за снимање на различни употреби на зборови и тие може да бидат атрактивна алтернатива за претставување на идиоматичноста на јазик. Во овој документ, предложуваме истражувачки мерки за да процениме дали некои од очекуваните јазични сопствености на именичките спојби, особено оние поврзани со идиоматски значења, и нивната зависност од контекст и чувствителност на лексикалниот избор, се лесно достапни во некои стандардни и широко употребени претс За тоа, ја изградивме датотеката на именички компонди, која содржи именички компонди и нивни парафрази, во контекст неутрални и контекст информативни натуралистички реченици, на два јазици: англиски и португалски. Резултатите добиени со користење на четири типови на мерки за проверка со модели како ЕЛМО, БЕРТ и некои од нејзините варијанти, покажуваат дека идиоматичноста сé уште не е прецизно претставена од контекстуални модели', 'ml': 'വ്യത്യസ്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനായി വികസിച്ച വാക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d വിജയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ഭാഷയില ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട ചില ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d, പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d, പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d, പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കുന അതിനുവേണ്ടി ന്യൂട്ടില്ലാത്ത വാക്കുകളില്\u200d ന്യൂട്ടില്ലാത്ത സാധാരണ വാക്കുകളില്\u200d, രണ്ടു ഭാഷകളില്\u200d: ഇംഗ്ലീഷും പോര്\u200dട്ടുഗ്ഗീഷും ഉള്ള ന്യൂട്ട ELMo, BERT എന്നിട്ടും അതിന്റെ ചില മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നാലു തരം പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli ta’ rappreżentazzjoni tal-kliem kontextwali ntużaw b’suċċess biex jinkisbu użi differenti tal-kliem u jistgħu jkunu alternattiva attraenti għar-rappreżentazzjoni tal-idjomatiċità fil-lingwa. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu miżuri ta’ sondaġġ biex jiġi vvalutat jekk xi wħud mill-karatteristiċi lingwistiċi mistennija tal-komposti nominali, speċjalment dawk relatati mat-tifsiriet idjomatiċi, u d-dipendenza tagħhom fuq il-kuntest u s-sensittività għall-għażla lexika, humiex disponibbli faċilment f’xi rappreżentazzjonijiet standard u użati b’mod wiesa’. Għal dak il-għan, aħna bnejna s-Sett tad-Dejta tan-Noun Compound Senses, li fih komposti tan-nomin u l-parafrażijiet tagħhom, f’sentenzi naturalistiċi newtrali fil-kuntest u informativi fil-kuntest, f’żewġ lingwi: l-Ingliż u l-Portugiż. Ir-riżultati miksuba bl-użu ta’ erba’ tipi ta’ miżuri ta’ sondaġġ b’mudelli bħal ELMo, BERT u xi wħud mill-varjanti tiegħu, jindikaw li l-idjomatiċità għadha mhijiex rappreżentata b’mod preċiż minn mudelli kuntestwalizzati', 'mn': 'Өөр үг хэрэглэгдэхэд амжилттай хэрэглэгдсэн үг илэрхийлэл загвар нь хэл дээр илэрхийлэх загвар байж болно. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэдэн хэлний хэлбэрийн өөрчлөлтийг шалгахын тулд судалгааны шалгалтыг санал болгож байна. Ялангуяа хэлбэрийн утгатай холбоотой хүмүүс, тэдний харьцуулалт, сэтгэл хөдлөлт, сэтгэл хөдлөлт, хэлний сонголт дээр хамааралтай байдал зарим Үүний тулд бид Нэг төрлийн мэдээллийн өгөгдлийг бүтээсэн. Энэ нь нэр төрлийн холбоотой болон тэдний парафразын холбоотой мэдээллийн натуралист өгөгдлийг хоёр хэл дээр бүтээсэн. ЭЛМО, БЕРТ болон зарим өөрчлөлтийн загвартай 4 төрлийн судалгааны шалгалтыг ашиглаж авсан үр дүн нь тэгш байдал нь орчин үеийн загвараар зөв дүрслэгдсэн байхгүй гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Kontekstualiserte ordrepresentasjonsmodular er fullført brukte for å henta forskjellige ordbrukar og dei kan vera eit attraktiv alternativet for å representera idiomatiket i språk. I denne papiret foreslår vi proberingsmålingar for å vurdere om nokre av dei forventane lingviske eigenskapane til namnet-samlingar, spesielt dei som er relaterte til idiomatiske meningar, og deres avhengighet på kontekst og sensitivitet til leksiske valet er lett tilgjengelege i nokre standard og breidde brukte representasjonar. Dette har vi konstruert Noun Compound Senses Dataset, som inneheld substantive kombinasjonar og parafrasene sine, i kontekst nøytralt og kontekstinformativt naturalistisk setningar, i to språk: engelsk og portugisk. Resultatet som er henta med fire typar proberingsmål med modeller som ELMo, BERT og nokre av variantane, tyder på at idiomatiket enno ikkje er nøyaktig representert av kontekstualiserte modeller', 'pl': 'Kontekstualizowane modele reprezentacji słów zostały z powodzeniem wykorzystane do uchwycenia różnych zastosowań słów i mogą stanowić atrakcyjną alternatywę dla reprezentowania idiomatyki w języku. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy środki sondowania, aby ocenić, czy niektóre z oczekiwanych właściwości językowych związków rzeczownika, zwłaszcza te związane z znaczeniami idiomatycznymi, oraz ich zależność od kontekstu i wrażliwości na wybór leksykalny, są łatwo dostępne w niektórych standardowych i powszechnie stosowanych reprezentacjach. W tym celu skonstruowaliśmy zestaw danych rzeczowników Compound Senses, który zawiera związki rzeczowników i ich parafrazy, w zdaniach neutralnych kontekstowych i kontekstowych informacyjnych naturalistycznych, w dwóch językach: angielskim i portugalskim. Wyniki uzyskane przy użyciu czterech rodzajów mierzeń sondowych z modelami takimi jak ELMo, BERT i niektóre z jego wariantów wskazują, że idiomatyczność nie jest jeszcze dokładnie reprezentowana przez modele kontekstualizowane', 'ro': 'Modelele contextualizate de reprezentare a cuvintelor au fost folosite cu succes pentru captarea diferitelor utilizări de cuvinte și pot fi o alternativă atractivă pentru reprezentarea idiomaticității în limbaj. În această lucrare, propunem măsuri de sondare pentru a evalua dacă unele dintre proprietățile lingvistice așteptate ale compușilor substantivelor, în special cele legate de semnificațiile idiomatice, și dependența lor de context și sensibilitatea la alegerea lexicală, sunt ușor disponibile în unele reprezentări standard și utilizate pe scară largă. Pentru aceasta, am construit setul de date al substantivelor compuse, care conține compuși de substantive și parafraze ale acestora, în context neutru și context informativ naturalist fraze, în două limbi: engleză și portugheză. Rezultatele obținute folosind patru tipuri de măsurători de sondare cu modele precum ELMo, BERT și unele dintre variantele sale indică faptul că idiomaticitatea nu este încă reprezentată cu precizie de modele contextualizate', 'sr': 'Kontekstualizirani modeli predstavljanja reèi su uspešno korišteni za uhvaæenje različitih upotrebe reèi i možda su privlaèna alternativa za predstavljanje idiomatiènosti na jeziku. U ovom papiru predlažemo da li su neki od očekivanih jezičkih vlasništva imenskih spojeva, posebno oni koji su povezani sa idiomatskim značenjima, i njihova zavisnost od konteksta i osjetljivosti na leksički izbor, lako dostupna u nekim standardnim i širokim korištenim predstavljanjima. Zbog toga smo izgradili Noun Compound Senses Dataset, koji sadrži imenske spojeve i njihove parafraze, u kontekstu neutralne i kontekstske informativne prirodne rečenice, na dva jezika: engleski i portugalski. Rezultati koji su dobili koristeći četiri vrste istraživanja sa modelima poput ELMo, BERT i nekih od njegovih varianta ukazuju na to da idiomatičnost još nije precizno predstavljena kontekstualizacijskim modelima.', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ වචන ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය වෙනස් වචන භාවිතාව අල්ලන්න සමහරවිට භාවිත කරලා තියෙන්න පුළුවන් වචන වචන විකල්පයක්  මේ පැත්තේ, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්වාස කරනවා නම්, විශේෂයෙන් මෝඩ ඒකෙන්, අපි නැවන් සම්පූර්ණ සංවිධානය සම්පූර්ණ සංවිධානය සහ ඔවුන්ගේ පැරැෆ්\u200dරේස් සම්පූර්ණ සංවිධානය සහ සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ලැබුනේ ELMo, BERT වගේ මෝඩල් වගේ පරීක්ෂණ මාර්ගයක් හතර වර්ගයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තිය', 'ta': 'உள்ளடக்க வார்த்தை குறிப்பிடும் மாதிரிகள் வெற்றிகரமாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது வேறு வார்த்தைகளை பயன்படுத்தும் மற்றும் மொழிய இந்த காகிதத்தில், எதிர்பார்க்கப்பட்ட சில மொழி கூட்டுக்களின் தன்மைகளை மதிப்பிட நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். குறிப்பிட்ட மூட்டியல் அர்த்தத்தில் தொடர்புடையவர்கள், மற்றும் அவர அதுக்காக, நாங்கள் நூன் கூட்டு தகவல் அமைப்பை உருவாக்கினோம், அதில் இல்லாத கூறுகள் மற்றும் அளபுருக்கள் உள்ளன, சூழல் மற்றும் சூழ்நிலையில் தகவல் இயற்கை Name', 'so': 'Tusaale u dhigashada hadalka la xiriira waxaa loo isticmaalay liibaansan in lagu qabsado isticmaalka hadalka kala duwan, waxayna noqon karaan mid u bedela doorasho ka mid ah wakiilka idiomnimada luuqada. Qoraalkan waxaan ka soo jeedaynaa in aan qiimeynayo in qaar ka mid ah waxyaabaha la rajaynay ee noocyada ah, khusuusan kuwa la xiriira maandooriyaha idiotiga iyo ku xiran dabeecada iyo xilliga doorashada lexicka, waxaa si fudud loogu helaa noocyo caadi ah oo aad u isticmaalaya. Taas darteed waxaynu dhisnay kooxaha kooxaha ee Noun Compound Senses, taas oo ku jirta kooxaha aan jirin iyo marxaladooda, kooxaha kooxaha iyo kooxaha macluumaadka asalka ah, laba luqadood: Ingiriis iyo Burtuqiis. Resultiyada waxaa laga helay isticmaalka afar noocyo oo tijaabinta ah, tusaale ahaan ELMo, BERT iyo qaarkood oo kala duwan, waxay tustaa in idiotinimada weli aysan si saxda ah u muuqan qaababka la soo jeedo', 'sv': 'Kontextualiserade ordrepresentationsmodeller har framgångsrikt använts för att fånga olika ordanvändningar och de kan vara ett attraktivt alternativ för att representera idiomatik i språket. I denna uppsats föreslår vi sonderingsåtgärder för att bedöma om några av de förväntade språkliga egenskaperna hos substantivföreningar, särskilt de relaterade till idiomatiska betydelser, och deras beroende av sammanhang och känslighet för lexikalt val, är lättillgängliga i vissa vanliga och allmänt använda representationer. För detta konstruerade vi Noun Compound Senses Dataset, som innehåller substantivföreningar och deras parafraser, i kontextneutrala och kontextinformativa naturalistiska meningar, på två språk: engelska och portugisiska. Resultat som erhållits med hjälp av fyra typer av sondmätningar med modeller som ELMo, BERT och några av dess varianter indikerar att idiomatik ännu inte exakt representeras av kontextuella modeller', 'ur': 'مختلف کلمات استعمال کے ذریعے مفید طور پر استعمال کیا گیا ہے اور وہ زبان میں مغرور کی تصویر کرنے کے لئے بہترین انتخاب ہو سکتے ہیں. اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے اسپرینگ کے مطابق مطابق مقدار کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ اگر نوم کی تعلقات کی کچھ انتظار کی زبان تعلقات میں سے ہیں، مخصوصاً ان کے مطابق مطابق مطابق کے ساتھ، اور ان کی تعلقات اور احساسات کے ساتھ لکسیکی اختیار کے ساتھ، کچھ استاندارڈ اور وسیع طریق اس کے لئے ہم نے نائن پیوند سنس ڈاٹ سٹ بنایا ہے، جس میں نوم پیوند اور ان کے پارافریز ہیں، نائرٹی اور محیط اطلاعات طبیعی کلمات میں، دو زبانوں میں: انگلیسی اور پورٹوگلیسی. نتیجے جو ELMo، BERT اور اس کے بعض متفاوتوں کے مطابق چار طریقے پرنسوی مطابق کے مطابق حاصل کئے گئے ہیں، نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ابھی مطابق مطابق موڈل کے ذریعہ مطابق مطابق نہیں ہیں', 'uz': "Name Bu hujjatda biz kutilgan tillar xossalarini tasavvur qilamiz, agar bir necha ishlatilgan tillik xossalarini, hususan idiomatik ma'nolariga bog'liq boʻlgan narsalarni va leksik tanlangan muhimlik va sensitiyatga ishlatish imkoniyatini o'rganish mumkin, bir necha standard va katta ishlatilgan tashkilotlar davomida imkoniyatlar mav Bu uchun biz ikki tillarda ma'lumot tarkibini yaratdik. Ingliz va Portugalcha (Ingliz va Portugalcha) bir xil tarkibi so'zlari ichida hech qanday narsalar va paravrlar mavjud emas. Name", 'vi': 'Chế độ phân biệt từ tương ứng đã được sử dụng thành công để bắt giữ các từ sử dụng khác nhau và chúng có thể là một thay thế hấp dẫn để đại diện cho tính cách của ngôn ngữ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị tìm kiếm các biện pháp xác định xem liệu một số các đặc tính ngôn ngữ mong đợi của các hợp âm danh, đặc biệt những tính có liên quan đến ngôn ngữ, và sự phụ thuộc vào ngữ cảnh và nhạy cảm với ngôn ngữ văn học, có sẵn sàng ở các biểu tượng phổ biến. Vì vậy, chúng tôi đã xây dựng dữ liệu tỉnh Noun, nó chứa các hợp đồng danh từ và các liệt giải của họ, trong bối cảnh trung lập và ngữ cảnh các câu nói tự nhiên có thông tin, bằng hai ngôn ngữ: Anh ngữ và Bồ Đào Nha. Kết quả được phát hiện bằng bốn loại biện pháp thăm dò với các mô hình như ElMo, BERT và một số biến thể của nó, cho thấy rằng tính biểu tượng không được xác định chính xác bằng các mô hình tương tự.', 'bg': 'Контекстualiзираните модели за представяне на думи успешно се използват за улавяне на различни употреби на думи и те могат да бъдат привлекателна алтернатива за представяне на идиоматиката в езика. В настоящата статия предлагаме пробни мерки за оценка дали някои от очакваните лингвистични свойства на съществителните съединения, особено тези, свързани с идиоматичните значения, и тяхната зависимост от контекста и чувствителността към лексикалния избор, са лесно достъпни в някои стандартни и широко използвани представи. За целта изградихме набор от данни за сетива на съществителното, който съдържа съединения на съществителното и техните парафрази, в контекст неутрални и контекст информативни натуралистични изречения, на два езика: английски и португалски. Резултатите, получени чрез използване на четири вида сондиращи мерки с модели като ELMo, BERT и някои от неговите варианти, показват, че идиоматичността все още не е точно представена от контекстуализираните модели', 'da': 'Kontekstualiserede ordrepræsentationsmodeller er blevet brugt med succes til at fange forskellige ordbrug, og de kan være et attraktivt alternativ til at repræsentere idiomatik i sproget. I denne artikel foreslår vi undersøgelsesforanstaltninger for at vurdere, om nogle af de forventede sproglige egenskaber af substantivforbindelser, især dem relateret til idiomatiske betydninger, og deres afhængighed af kontekst og følsomhed over for leksikalske valg, er let tilgængelige i nogle standard og bredt anvendte repræsentationer. Til dette har vi konstrueret Noun Compound Senses datasættet, som indeholder substantivforbindelser og deres parafraser, i kontekst neutrale og kontekst informative naturalistiske sætninger, på to sprog: engelsk og portugisisk. Resultater opnået ved hjælp af fire typer sondemålinger med modeller som ELMo, BERT og nogle af dens varianter indikerer, at idiomatikken endnu ikke præcist repræsenteres af kontekstualiserede modeller', 'nl': 'Gecontextualiseerde woordrepresentatiemodellen zijn met succes gebruikt voor het vastleggen van verschillende woordgebruik en ze kunnen een aantrekkelijk alternatief zijn voor het weergeven van idiomatica in taal. In dit artikel stellen we onderzoeksmaatregelen voor om te beoordelen of sommige van de verwachte linguïstische eigenschappen van zelfstandige naamwoorden, vooral die gerelateerd aan idiomatische betekenissen, en hun afhankelijkheid van context en gevoeligheid voor lexicale keuze, gemakkelijk beschikbaar zijn in sommige standaard en veel gebruikte representaties. Hiervoor hebben we de Dataset Noun Compound Senses samengesteld, die zelfstandige naamwoorden en hun parafrases bevat, in contextneutrale en contextinformatieve naturalistische zinnen, in twee talen: Engels en Portugees. Resultaten verkregen met behulp van vier soorten meetmetingen met modellen als ELMo, BERT en enkele van zijn varianten, wijzen erop dat idiomatica nog niet nauwkeurig wordt weergegeven door contextualiseerde modellen', 'hr': 'Kontekstualizirani modeli predstavljanja riječi uspješno su korišteni za uhvaćenje različitih primjena riječi i mogu biti privlačna alternativa za predstavljanje idiomatičnosti na jeziku. U ovom papiru predlažemo ispitivanje mjera za procjenu da li su neki od očekivanih jezičkih vlasništva imenskih spojeva, posebno oni koji su povezani s idiomatskim smislama, i njihova zavisnost od konteksta i osjetljivosti na leksički izbor, spremna u nekim standardnim i širokim korištenim predstavljanjima. Zbog toga smo izgradili Noun Compound Senses Dataset, koji sadrži imenske spojeve i njihove parafraze, u kontekstu neutralne i kontekstne informativne prirodne rečenice, na dva jezika: engleski i portugalski. Rezultati koji su dobili koristeći četiri vrste ispitivanja s modelima poput ELMo, BERT i nekih od njegovih varianta ukazuju na to da idiomatičnost još nije precizno predstavljena kontekstualiziranim modelima', 'de': 'Kontextualisierte Wortdarstellungsmodelle wurden erfolgreich zur Erfassung verschiedener Wortverwendungen eingesetzt und können eine attraktive Alternative zur Darstellung von Idiomatizität in Sprache darstellen. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir Untersuchungsmaßnahmen vor, um zu beurteilen, ob einige der erwarteten linguistischen Eigenschaften von Substantivverbindungen, insbesondere solche, die mit idiomatischen Bedeutungen zusammenhängen, und ihre Abhängigkeit vom Kontext und Sensibilität für lexikalische Wahl, in einigen gängigen und weit verbreiteten Repräsentationen leicht verfügbar sind. Dafür haben wir den Datensatz der Substantivverbundsinne konstruiert, der Substantivverbindungen und deren Paraphrasen in kontextneutralen und kontextinformativen naturalistischen Sätzen in zwei Sprachen enthält: Englisch und Portugiesisch. Die Ergebnisse, die mit vier Arten von Sondierungsmaßnahmen mit Modellen wie ELMo, BERT und einigen seiner Varianten erzielt wurden, zeigen, dass die Idiomatik durch kontextualisierte Modelle noch nicht genau dargestellt wird.', 'id': 'Model representation kata kontekstual telah berhasil digunakan untuk menangkap penggunaan kata yang berbeda dan mereka mungkin alternatif menarik untuk mewakili idiomatitas dalam bahasa. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan tindakan penyelidikan untuk menilai apakah beberapa dari properti bahasa yang diharapkan dari komponen nama, terutama yang berhubungan dengan makna idiomatis, dan ketergantuan mereka pada konteks dan sensitivitas untuk pilihan lexik, mudah tersedia dalam beberapa standar dan representation yang luas digunakan. Untuk itu, kami membangun Dataset Senses Komponen Nama, yang mengandung komponen nama dan parafrasa mereka, dalam konteks neutral dan konteks kalimat informatif alam, dalam dua bahasa: Bahasa Inggris dan Portugis. Hasil yang diperoleh dengan menggunakan empat jenis ukuran penyelidikan dengan model seperti ELMo, BERT dan beberapa variantnya, menunjukkan bahwa idiomatitas belum ditempatkan dengan tepat oleh model kontekstualisasi', 'ko': '어경화된 어휘 표현 모델은 이미 서로 다른 어휘의 사용법을 포착하는 데 성공했고, 그것들은 언어의 습어성을 표현하는 매력적인 대체 방법일 수도 있다.본고에서 우리는 명사 복합어의 예상 언어 특성, 특히 습어의 의미와 관련된 특성, 그리고 언어 환경에 대한 의존성과 어휘 선택에 대한 민감성이 일부 기준과 광범위하게 사용되는 표징에서 쉽게 얻을 수 있는지를 평가하기 위해 탐색적인 조치를 제시했다.이를 위해 우리는 영어와 포르투갈어 두 언어로 명사 복합적 의미 데이터 집합을 구축했는데 그 중에서 명사 복합어와 그 해석을 포함하고 상하문과 상관없이 상하문 정보가 풍부한 자연주의 문장에 있다.ELMo, BERT 및 일부 변형 모델을 사용한 네 가지 탐지 측정 결과, 어경화 모델은 아직 습어성을 정확하게 나타내지 못했다.', 'fa': 'مدل نمایش کلمات متوسط به موفقیت برای گرفتن استفاده از کلمات متفاوتی استفاده شده است و ممکن است جایگزینی جذابی باشد برای نمایش نمایش احمقانه در زبان. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که برخی از ویژگی\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی انتظار داشته\u200cاند، مخصوصاً کسانی که مربوط به معنی\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی هستند، و بستگی\u200cشان بر محیط و حساسیت به انتخاب زبان\u200cشناسی، در بعضی نمایش\u200cهای استاندارد و وسیع استفاده می\u200cشوند، برای ار برای این، ما مجموعهٔ مجموعهٔ مجموعهٔ مجموعهٔ مجموعهٔ مجموعهٔ مجموعهٔ مجموعهٔ مجموعهٔ مجموعهٔ مجموعهٔ مجموعهٔ مجموعهٔ مجموعهٔ مجموعهٔ مجموعهٔ مجموعهٔ نتیجه\u200cهایی که با استفاده از چهار نوع اندازه\u200cهای تحقیق با مدل\u200cهای مانند ELMo، BERT و بعضی از متفاوت\u200cهایش، نشان می\u200cدهند که احمقانه هنوز با مدل\u200cهای متفاوت دقیق نمایش داده نمی\u200cشود', 'sw': 'Contextualised word representation models have been successfully used for capturing different word usages and they may be an attractive alternative for representing idiomaticity in language.  Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza kuchunguza hatua za kutathmini kama baadhi ya utaalam wa lugha zinazotarajiwa, hususani wale ambao wanahusiana na maana ya kijinga, na kutegemea kwa muktadha na uelewa wa uchaguzi wa lexico, wanapatikana kwa kiwango fulani na kuwakilisha kwa kiasi kikubwa. Kwa hilo, tulijenga seti ya Taarifa za Mazungumzo ya Noun Compound, ambayo ina viungo visivyo na vipengele vyao, kwa muktadha wa sentensi za asili na muktadha wa taarifa za asili, kwa lugha mbili: Kiingereza na Kireno. Matokeo yaliyopata kwa kutumia aina nne ya kuchunguza hatua za mifano kama ELMo, BERT na baadhi ya mabadiliko yake, yanaonyesha kuwa upumbavu bado haujawakilishwa sahihi na mifano yanayotajwa', 'tr': 'Çeşitli söz namaýyşlary başarmak üçin ullanýardy we olar dilinde gürrüňsiz sözleri temin etmek üçin bir seçenek bolup biler. Bu kagyzda, biz esasy bilen bolan lingwistiki hasaplanjaryň käbirleri, ýöne-ýöne kellämiz bilen baglanýan, we olaryň kontekste we duýdurlygyna seretseňiz gerekli hasaplanjaryň käbir standart we ullanýan suratlarda oňat bar. Şol üçin biz Täze Birleşik Senses Maglumatyny bejerdik. Bu iki dilde isim bilen birleşmelerini we parafrazlerini bardyr. Netijeler ELMo, BERT we onuň köpüsi variantlary bilen dört tür synag ölçümlerini ulanyp berildiler, samsyklyk henüz contextualizasyon modelleri tarapyndan edilmedigini belli edip bilýärler.', 'af': "Konteksualiseerde woord verteenwoordemodel is suksesvol gebruik vir verskillende woord gebruik te vang en hulle dalk dalk 'n atraktiewe alternatief wees vir verteenwoordigheid in taal. In hierdie papier voorstel ons probeer maatskappe om te asseer of sommige van die verwagte lingwisiese eienskappe van noulige verbindings, veral die verwante met idiomatiese betekenings, en hulle afhanklikheid op konteks en sensitiviteit tot leksiese kies, is leeg beskikbaar in sommige standaard en vaste gebruikte voorstellings. Daarom het ons die Noun Compound ingestel Dataset, wat noute verbindings en hulle parafrase bevat, in konteks neutrale en konteks inligtige natuurlike setinge, in twee tale: Engels en Portugees. Resultate wat verkry word met vier tipes probeer maat met modele soos ELMo, BERT en sommige van sy variante, wys dat idiomatiwiteit nog nie presies verteenwoordig is deur contextualiseerde modele nie", 'sq': 'Modelet e përfaqësimit të fjalëve të kontekstuar janë përdorur me sukses për kapjen e përdorimeve të ndryshme të fjalëve dhe ato mund të jenë një alternativë tërheqëse për përfaqësimin e idiomatizmit në gjuhë. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë masat e vëzhgimit për të vlerësuar nëse disa nga pronësitë gjuhësore të pritura të përbërjeve të emrave, veçanërisht ato të lidhura me kuptimet idiomatike dhe varësia e tyre nga konteksti dhe ndjeshmëria ndaj zgjedhjes lexike, janë në dispozicion të lehtë në disa përfaqësime standarde dhe të përdorura gjerësisht. Për këtë, ne ndërtuam një bazë të dhënash për sinjalet e përmbajtura të përmbajtura të përmbajtura të përmbajtura dhe parafrazat e tyre, në kontekst neutral dhe kontekst fjalë informative naturaliste, në dy gjuhë: anglisht dhe portugalisht. Rezultatet e fituara duke përdorur katër lloje masash sondazhi me modele si ELMo, BERT dhe disa nga variantet e saj, tregojnë se idiomatiteti ende nuk përfaqësohet saktësisht nga modelet kontekstualizuar', 'am': 'የንግግር መልዕክት ምሳሌዎች በተለየ የቃላትን ተጠቃሚ ለመያዝ የተጠቀሙ ናቸው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ በተስፋ የቋንቋዊ የቋንቋዊ ምርጫዎች፣ በተሰበሰቡት የኢንተርናዊ አእምሮዎች እና የሌክሲካዊ ምርጫዎች ላይ የሚታመኑ እና የስህተት ምርጫ ላይ የሚታመኑ መሆኑን ለማረጋገጥ እና በተዘጋጀ በተቃውሞ እና በተስፋት በተጠቃሚ መልዕክቶች ላይ የሚችሉ እንደሆነ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ለዚህ ምክንያት የኖun Compound Senses Dataset (Noun Compound Senses Dataset) ሠርተናል፤ ምንም ጉዳይ እና paraphrases እንደማይኖርበት የውይይይት እና አስተያየት የፍጥረታዊ ቃል በሁለት ቋንቋዎች: እንግሊዘኛ እና ፖርቱጋሊስ ነው። ፍጥረቶች በELMo፣ BERT እና አንዳንዶቹ መለወጫ እንደተካሄዱ አራት ዓይነት መጠቀሚያ መጠቀም የተገኙ ናቸው፡፡', 'hy': 'Բառերի ներկայացման համատեքստային մոդելները հաջողությամբ օգտագործվել են բառերի տարբեր օգտագործումների նկարահանման համար, և դրանք կարող են լինել գրավիչ այլընտրանք լեզվի իդեոմատիկայի ներկայացման համար: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք ուսումնասիրելու միջոցներ, որպեսզի գնահատենք, թե արդյոք անվանումների բաղադրիչների ակնկալվող լեզվաբանական հատկություններից որոշները, հատկապես այն հատկապես, որոնք կապված են իդոմատիկ իմաստով, և դրանց կախվածությունը կոնտեքստից և զգաց Այդ պատճառով մենք կառուցեցինք Անության համակարգված զգացմունքների տվյալների համակարգը, որը պարունակում է անունների համակարգեր և նրանց պարաֆրեզներ, կոնտեքստի չեզոք և կոնտեքստի ինֆորմատիվ նատուրալիստական նախադասություններում, երկու լեզուներով՝ անգլերե Արդյունքները, որոնք ստացվել են օգտագործելով 4 տեսակի փորձարկումներ ELMo-ի, BER-ի և դրա տարբերակների մոդելների հետ, ցույց են տալիս, որ անհեթեթությունը դեռևս ճշգրիտ ներկայացված չէ կոնտեքստիալ մոդելներով', 'az': 'Müxtəlif sözlər istifadə etmək üçün müvəffəqiyyətli söz göstəricisi modelləri müvəffəqiyyətlə istifadə edilmişdir və onlar dilində idiomatisyatı göstərmək üçün heyrətli alternatif olarlar. Bu kağızda, ismi birliklərinin gözlədiyi dil özelliklərindən, özlərinə də idiomatik anlayışlarına bağlı olanlardan və onların məlumatlarına bağlılığı və məlumatlarına layiq seçimlərə bağlılığı, bəzi standartlarda və geniş istifadə edilənlərdə asanlıqla faydalanır. Buna görə biz Nun Compound Senses Dataset in şa etdik, ki, ismi birlikləri və parafrazləri barəsində nörtral və məlumatlı naturalistik sözləri, iki dil: İngilizce və Portugalca. ElMo, BERT və onun variablarının bəzisi modellərlə dörd türü təminatı ölçülərini istifadə etdikləri sonuçlar belə göstərir ki, idiomatik hələ müxtəlif modellərlə dəyişdirilmədir.', 'bn': 'বিভিন্ন শব্দ ব্যবহার গ্রহণের জন্য বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্বের মডেল ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে এবং তারা ভাষায় নির্বোধের প্রতিন এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি যে কিছু প্রত্যাশিত ভাষাগত বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্য, বিশেষ করে যারা বুদ্ধিমান অর্থের সাথে সম্পর্কিত, আর তাদের প্রেক্ষাপট এবং লেক্সিক্সিক প এর জন্য আমরা নুন কমপাউন্ড সেন্সের তথ্য নির্মাণ করেছি, যার মধ্যে কোন উপাদান এবং তাদের প্যারাফেক্স নেই, যেখানে দুই ভাষায় প্রাকৃতিক তথ্য ও প্রাক্তন ত Results obtained using four types of probing measures with models like ELMo, BERT and some of its variants, indicate that idiomaticity is not yet accurately represented by contextualised models', 'bs': 'Kontekstualizirani modeli predstavljanja riječi su uspješno korišteni za uhvaćenje različitih korištenja riječi i možda su privlačna alternativa za predstavljanje idiomatičnosti na jeziku. U ovom papiru predlažemo ispitivanje mjera za procjenu da li su neki od očekivanih jezičkih vlasništva imenskih spojeva, posebno onih koji su povezani sa idiomatskim smislama, i njihova zavisnost od konteksta i osjetljivosti na leksički izbor, spremna u nekim standardnim i širokim korištenim predstavljanjima. Zbog toga smo izgradili Noun Compound Senses Dataset, koji sadrži imenske spojeve i njihove parafraze, u kontekstu neutralne i kontekstske informativne prirodne rečenice, na dva jezika: engleski i portugalski. Rezultati koji su dobili koristeći četiri vrste ispitivanja sa modelima poput ELMo, BERT i nekih od njegovih varianta ukazuju na to da idiomatičnost još nije precizno predstavljena kontekstualiziranim modelima', 'ca': "Els models contextuals de representació de paraules han estat utilitzats amb èxit per capturar diferents usos de paraules i poden ser una alternativa atractiva per representar la idiomàtica en el llenguatge. En aquest paper, proposem mesures d'investigació per avaluar si algunes de les propietats lingüístices esperades de composts de noms, especialment aquelles relacionades amb significats idiomàtics, i la seva dependència del context i la sensibilitat a l'elecció lexical, estan fàcilment disponibles en algunes representacions estàndard i amplament utilitzades. Per això vam construir el conjunt de dades de sentits composts de nou, que conté composts de nom i les seves parafrases, en un context neutral i contextual, en dues llengües: anglès i portuguès. Els resultats obtenits fent servir quatre tipus de mesures de sonda amb models com ELMo, BERT i algunes de les seves variants indican que la idiomàtica encara no està representada exactament per models contextualitzats", 'cs': 'Kontextualizované modely reprezentace slov byly úspěšně použity pro zachycení různých použití slov a mohou být atraktivní alternativou pro reprezentaci idiomatiky v jazyce. V tomto článku navrhujeme sondovací opatření k posouzení, zda jsou některé z očekávaných jazykových vlastností sloučenin podstatných jmen, zejména ty související s idiomatickými významy, a jejich závislost na kontextu a citlivosti na lexikální volbě, snadno dostupné v některých standardních a široce používaných reprezentacích. Za tímto účelem jsme vytvořili datovou sadu smyslů podstatných sloučenin a jejich parafrází v kontextově neutrálních a kontextově informativních naturalistických větách ve dvou jazycích: angličtině a portugalštině. Výsledky získané pomocí čtyř typů sondovacích opatření s modely jako ELMo, BERT a některé z jeho variant ukazují, že idiomatika dosud není přesně reprezentována kontextualizovanými modely', 'et': 'Kontekstuliseeritud sõnade esitamise mudeleid on edukalt kasutatud erinevate sõnakasutuste jäädvustamiseks ja need võivad olla atraktiivne alternatiiv idiomaatsuse esindamiseks keeles. Käesolevas töös pakume välja proovimeetmeid, et hinnata, kas mõned nimisõnaühendite oodatavad keelelised omadused, eriti idiomaatiliste tähendustega seotud omadused, ja nende sõltuvus kontekstist ja tundlikkus leksikaalsele valikule, on kergesti kättesaadavad mõnes standardses ja laialdaselt kasutatavas esituses. Selleks ehitasime substantiivkomplekti, mis sisaldab substantiivkomplekte ja nende parafraase konteksti neutraalsetes ja konteksti informatiivsetes naturalistilistes lausetes kahes keeles: inglise ja portugali keeles. Nelja tüüpi proovimeetmete kasutamisel saadud tulemused näitavad ELMo, BERT ja mõned selle variandid, et idiomaatsust ei esitata veel täpselt kontekstuaalsed mudelid', 'fi': 'Kontekstualisoituja sanaesitysmalleja on käytetty menestyksekkäästi erilaisten sanakäyttötapojen kuvaamiseen ja ne voivat olla houkutteleva vaihtoehto kielellisen idiomatiikan kuvaamiseen. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme kartoitusmenetelmiä sen arvioimiseksi, ovatko jotkin substantiiviyhdisteiden odotetut kielelliset ominaisuudet, erityisesti idiomaattisiin merkityksiin liittyvät ominaisuudet, sekä niiden riippuvuus kontekstista ja herkkyys leksikaaliselle valinnalle, helposti saatavilla joissakin vakiomuotoisissa ja laajalti käytetyissä esityksissä. Tätä varten rakensimme substantiivikompound Senses Datasetin, joka sisältää substantiivikomponentit ja niiden parafraasit kontekstista neutraaleina ja kontekstista informatiivisina naturalistisina lauseina kahdella kielellä: englanniksi ja portugaliksi. Neljäntyyppisistä luotausmenetelmistä saadut tulokset ELMo, BERT ja joidenkin sen varianttien avulla osoittavat, että idiomatiikkaa ei ole vielä tarkasti edustettu kontekstualisoiduissa malleissa.', 'he': 'דוגמני ייצוג מילים מקורקסטולים השתמשו בהצלחה כדי לתפוס שימוש מילים שונים והם עשויים להיות אלטרנטיבה מושכת לייצג אידיומטיות בשפה. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים אמצעי חקירה כדי להעריך אם חלק מהתכונות הלשוניות המצפויות של תרכובות השם, במיוחד אלה שקשורות למשמעות אידיומטיות, והתלויה שלהם בקשר והרגישות לבחירה לקסיקה, זמינות בקלות באיזה מיצוג סטנדרטי ומשתמש רחב. בשביל זה, בנינו את קבוצת הנתונים של חושים המרכיבים של השמות, שמכילה את התרכיבים של השמות והפראפרסמות שלהם, בקונקסט נוטרלי וקונקסט משפטים טבעיים מידעיים, בשתי שפות: אנגלית ופורטוגזית. תוצאות שנקבלו באמצעות ארבעה סוגים של מדידות חקירה עם דוגמנים כמו ELMo, BERT וכמה מהשונים שלה, מצביעים על כך שאידיומטיות עדיין לא מייצגת בדיוק על ידי דוגמנים קונטוקטואליזציונים', 'sk': 'Kontekstualizacijski modeli predstavitve besed so bili uspešno uporabljeni za zajemanje različnih uporab besed in so lahko privlačna alternativa za predstavitev idiomatičnosti v jeziku. V prispevku predlagamo preiskovalne ukrepe za oceno, ali so nekatere od pričakovanih jezikovnih lastnosti samostalniških spojin, zlasti tistih, povezanih z idiomatskimi pomeni, in njihove odvisnosti od konteksta in občutljivosti na leksikalno izbiro, zlahka dostopne v nekaterih standardnih in široko uporabljenih reprezentacijah. Za to smo zgradili nabor podatkov o samostalnikih, ki vsebuje samostalnikove spojine in njihove parafraze v kontekstni nevtralni in kontekstni informativni naturalistični stavki v dveh jezikih: angleščini in portugalščini. Rezultati, pridobljeni z uporabo štirih vrst merilnih meril z modeli ELMo, BERT in nekaterimi njegovimi različicami, kažejo, da idiomatičnost še ni natančno predstavljena s kontekstualiziranimi modeli.', 'ha': "An ci amfani da misãlai masu tsari da maganar da aka ƙunsa da shi, dõmin su sami da amfani da wasu kalmõmi na dabam-daban kuma sukan su kasance wata shida mai zura wa wakilisha mutane cikin harshe. Daga wannan takardan, Munã bukãta kafaffiyata ko da za'a iya ƙayyade wasu properties na linguistic cikin birnin da ba'a ƙayyade ba, da haske waɗanda ke da kamid da ma'anar dumori, da kuma masu dõgara a kan mazaɓa da muhimmanci da gane wa zaɓallin leki, za'a iya amfani da shi a cikin wani gwargwadon da aka yi amfani da. Daga wannan, mun gina danne-tsarin Noun CompComposite, wanda bã ya da compound da parameters, cikin muhalli na tsakanin da mazaɓa masu hankali na naturalist, cikin harshen biyu: Ingiriya da Portugal. Result", 'jv': 'word representation Awak dhéwé in êp kuwi, kéné supoyo nggawe perintasi kanggo nggunakake karo nganggo cara-cara sing paling nggambar kanggo ngerasakno sing nêmêr, supoyo cara-cara sing nggawe gerakan akeh idiomat, lan dipulangan dipulangan karo kontèks lan susahleterané kanggo langkung rawuh akeh luwih lanjut. Saiki iki, awak dhéwé nggawe barang-barang Néung kompundu Senses Dateacet, sing nganggo pergambar barang nggambar lan paraFrases dhéwé, ning titik dhéwé Where am I kontèks Senses Senses Daftar informasi, ning langgambar dhéwé: Inggris karo Putuk. @item Text character set', 'bo': 'རྣམ་གྲངས་བསྡུས་པའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་མི་འདྲ་བ་ལས་སྤྱོད་སྟངས འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་རེ་བ་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཉིད་ཡིན་ན། ཁྱད་པར་ན་དེ་དག་གི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཉིད་དང་ཁྱད་ཆོས་སྤྲེལ་ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་Noun Compound Senses Dataset་ལ་བཟོ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། Results obtained using four types of probing measures with models like ELMo, BERT and some of its variants, indicate that idiomaticity is not yet accurately represented by contextualized models'}
{'en': 'Is the Understanding of Explicit Discourse Relations Required in Machine Reading Comprehension?', 'fr': 'La compréhension des relations de discours explicites est-elle requise pour comprendre la lecture automatique\xa0?', 'ar': 'هل فهم علاقات الخطاب الصريح مطلوب في الفهم القرائي للآلة؟', 'es': '¿Es necesaria la comprensión de las relaciones explícitas del discurso en la comprensión de la lectura automática?', 'pt': 'A compreensão das relações discursivas explícitas é necessária na compreensão da leitura de máquina?', 'ja': '機械読解には、明示的な言説関係の理解が求められるのか？', 'hi': 'क्या स्पष्ट प्रवचन संबंधों की समझ मशीन रीडिंग कॉम्प्रिहेंशन में आवश्यक है?', 'zh': '机器读显式语否?', 'ru': 'Требуется ли понимание явных отношений дискурса в понимании машинного чтения?', 'ga': 'An Teastaíonn Tuiscint ar Chaidrimh Dhioscúrsa Mhearn i dTuiscint Meaisín-Léamh?', 'ka': 'პაჱბთპაŒვრჲ ნა ვკჟოლთკრთფნთ ევჟკსპჟკთ გპყჱკთ, კჲთრჲ თჟკარ გ კჲმოპვნჟთწ ჱა მაქთნჟკთ ფვრვნვ?', 'el': 'Απαιτείται η κατανόηση των ρητών σχέσεων συζήτησης στην κατανόηση της μηχανικής ανάγνωσης;', 'hu': 'Szükséges-e a kifejezett beszédkapcsolatok megértése a gépi olvasás megértésében?', 'it': 'La comprensione delle relazioni di discorso esplicite è richiesta nella comprensione della lettura automatica?', 'lt': 'Ar aiškių diskurso santykių supratimas reikalingas skaitant mašinas?', 'kk': 'Компьютерді оқу үшін керек түсініктер қатынасын түсініңіз бе?', 'mk': 'Дали разбирањето на јасните односи со дискурсот е потребно за разбирање на читањето на машините?', 'ml': 'മെഷീന്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d എക്സ്പ്ലിക്റ്റ് ഡിസ്കോര്\u200dസ് ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെ മനസ്സ് ആവശ്യമുണ്ടോ?', 'ms': 'Adakah pemahaman hubungan hubungan jelas diperlukan dalam Pemahaman Pembacaan Mesin?', 'mn': 'Машин уншихад шаардлагатай тайлбарлалтын харилцааны ойлголт юу?', 'mt': 'Il-fehim tar-relazzjonijiet ta’ diskors espliċitu huwa meħtieġ fil-Komprensjoni tal-qari tal-makkinarju?', 'no': 'Er forståking av eksplisitt diskursrelasjonar nødvendig i komprimeringa for maskinelesing?', 'pl': 'Czy zrozumienie wyraźnych relacji dyskursowych jest wymagane w zrozumieniu odczytu maszynowego?', 'ro': 'Înțelegerea relațiilor de discurs explicit este necesară în înțelegerea citirii automate?', 'sr': 'Da li je razumijevanje veza sa eksplozivnim diskusijama potrebno u komprehenziji za čitanje mašina?', 'sv': 'Krävs förståelsen av explicita diskursrelationer i maskinläsförståelse?', 'si': 'මැෂින් කියවන්න සම්බන්ධයෙන් අවශ්\u200dය විස්තර සංවේදනය තේරුම් ගන්නවද?', 'so': 'Ma waxgarashada dhibaatooyinka looga baahan yahay qoraalka akhriska Masiinka?', 'ta': 'இயந்திரம் படிக்கும் முடிவில் புரிந்து கொள்ள வேண்டுமா?', 'ur': 'کیا ماشین پڑھنے کی تعلیم میں صریح گفتگو رابطہ کا سمجھنا ضروری ہے؟', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Có phải sự hiểu biết về quan hệ hủy diệt không yêu cầu trong sự hiểu biết về máy?', 'bg': 'Необходимо ли е разбирането на изричните дискурсни отношения при разбирането за машинното четене?', 'nl': 'Is het begrijpen van expliciete discoursrelaties vereist bij het begrijpen van machinelezen?', 'hr': 'Da li je razumijevanje odnosa eksplozivnih diskusija potrebno u komprehenziji za čitanje strojeva?', 'da': 'Kræves forståelsen af eksplicitte diskursrelationer i maskinlæsning?', 'de': 'Ist das Verständnis expliziter Diskursbeziehungen im maschinellen Leseverständnis erforderlich?', 'fa': 'آیا درک رابطه\u200cهای صحبت روشنی لازم است در تفصیل خواندن ماشین؟', 'ko': '기계독해에서 현성어의 관계를 이해해야 합니까?', 'id': 'Apakah Pemahaman Hubungan Diskus Jelas Diperlukan dalam Pemahaman Pembaca Mesin?', 'tr': 'Maşynyň Okamak Derjesinde Explicit Gezginlerin düşünmesi gerek?', 'sq': 'A është e nevojshme kuptimi i marrëdhënieve të shprehura të diskutimit në kuptimin e leximit të makinave?', 'am': 'የመስመር ግንኙነት ማስተዋል በመሳሪያው በማንበብ አነብብ ይፈልጋሉን?', 'sw': 'Je, uelewa wa mahusiano ya Utafiti unahitajika katika Mashiniki ya Kusoma Uwekezaji?', 'hy': 'Is the Understanding of Explicit Discourse Relations Required in Machine Reading Comprehension?', 'af': 'Is die Verstaan van Explicit Discourse Relations benodig in Masjien Lees Kompresie?', 'az': 'Makineli oxumaq müqabilində istifadə edilən açıq sözlər əlaqələrinin anlaşılması lazımdır?', 'bs': 'Da li je razumijevanje veza sa eksplozivnim diskusijama potrebno u komprehenziji za čitanje mašina?', 'bn': 'মেশিনে কি এক্সপ্লিকিট ডিসার্সের সম্পর্কের বুঝতে চায়?', 'ca': 'És la comprensió de les relacions de discurs explícits requerida per a la comprensió de la lectura màquina?', 'cs': 'Je pochopení explicitních diskursních vztahů vyžadováno při pochopení strojového čtení?', 'et': 'Kas masinlugemise mõistmisel on nõutav selgesõnaliste vestlussuhete mõistmist?', 'fi': 'Onko konelukemisen ymmärtämisessä vaadittava eksplisiittisten diskurssisuhteiden ymmärtäminen?', 'jv': 'Opo sampeyan Panjenengan Rasané Kebudhakan Rasané Gaka Kelangan Nang Sistem Rasané Panjenengan?', 'ha': 'Shin, ana ƙayyade fahimtar Farawa na Explicit', 'sk': 'Ali je razumevanje eksplicitnih diskurznih odnosov potrebno pri razumevanju strojnega branja?', 'bo': 'མ་ལག་གི་ཀློག་འཇུག་བརྟན་འཛིན་པའི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་དག་གི་གོ་སྐད་ཡིན་ནམ།', 'he': 'האם ההבנה של מערכות יחסים ברורות דורשת בהבנה של קריאת מכונות?'}
{'en': 'An in-depth analysis of the level of language understanding required by existing Machine Reading Comprehension (MRC) benchmarks can provide insight into the reading capabilities of machines. In this paper, we propose an ablation-based methodology to assess the extent to which MRC datasets evaluate the understanding of explicit discourse relations. We define seven MRC skills which require the understanding of different discourse relations. We then introduce ablation methods that verify whether these skills are required to succeed on a dataset. By observing the drop in performance of neural MRC models evaluated on the original and the modified dataset, we can measure to what degree the dataset requires these skills, in order to be understood correctly. Experiments on three large-scale datasets with the BERT-base and ALBERT-xxlarge model show that the relative changes for all skills are small (less than 6 %). These results imply that most of the answered questions in the examined datasets do not require understanding the discourse structure of the text. To specifically probe for natural language understanding, there is a need to design more challenging benchmarks that can correctly evaluate the intended skills.', 'fr': "Une analyse approfondie du niveau de compréhension de la langue requis par les tests de compréhension de lecture automatique (MRC) existants peut fournir un aperçu des capacités de lecture des machines. Dans cet article, nous proposons une méthodologie basée sur l'ablation pour évaluer dans quelle mesure les ensembles de données MRC évaluent la compréhension des relations de discours explicites. Nous définissons sept compétences MRC qui nécessitent la compréhension de différentes relations discursives. Nous introduisons ensuite des méthodes d'ablation qui vérifient si ces compétences sont requises pour réussir sur un ensemble de données. En observant la baisse de performance des modèles MRC neuronaux évalués sur l'ensemble de données original et modifié, nous pouvons mesurer dans quelle mesure l'ensemble de données nécessite ces compétences, afin d'être compris correctement. Des expériences sur trois ensembles de données à grande échelle avec le modèle BERT-base et Albert-XXLarge montrent que les changements relatifs pour toutes les compétences sont faibles (moins de 6\xa0%). Ces résultats impliquent que la plupart des questions auxquelles on a répondu dans les ensembles de données examinés ne nécessitent pas de comprendre la structure du discours du texte. Pour étudier spécifiquement la compréhension du langage naturel, il est nécessaire de concevoir des points de référence plus exigeants capables d'évaluer correctement les compétences recherchées.", 'ar': 'يمكن أن يوفر التحليل المتعمق لمستوى فهم اللغة المطلوب بواسطة معايير فهم القراءة الآلية (MRC) الحالية نظرة ثاقبة لقدرات القراءة للآلات. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح منهجية قائمة على الاجتثاث لتقييم مدى تقييم مجموعات بيانات مركز البحوث الطبية لفهم علاقات الخطاب الصريح. نحدد سبع مهارات في مركز موارد المهاجرين تتطلب فهم علاقات الخطاب المختلفة. نقدم بعد ذلك طرق الاجتثاث التي تتحقق مما إذا كانت هذه المهارات مطلوبة للنجاح في مجموعة البيانات. من خلال ملاحظة الانخفاض في أداء نماذج MRC العصبية التي تم تقييمها على مجموعة البيانات الأصلية والمعدلة ، يمكننا قياس إلى أي درجة تتطلب مجموعة البيانات هذه المهارات ، حتى يتم فهمها بشكل صحيح. تُظهر التجارب على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات كبيرة الحجم باستخدام نموذج BERT-Base و ALBERT-xxlarge أن التغييرات النسبية لجميع المهارات صغيرة (أقل من 6٪). تشير هذه النتائج إلى أن معظم الأسئلة التي تمت الإجابة عليها في مجموعات البيانات التي تم فحصها لا تتطلب فهم بنية خطاب النص. لاستكشاف فهم اللغة الطبيعية على وجه التحديد ، هناك حاجة لتصميم معايير أكثر تحديًا يمكنها تقييم المهارات المقصودة بشكل صحيح.', 'es': 'Un análisis en profundidad del nivel de comprensión del lenguaje requerido por los puntos de referencia existentes de comprensión de lectura automática (MRC) puede proporcionar información sobre las capacidades de lectura de las máquinas. En este artículo, proponemos una metodología basada en la ablación para evaluar hasta qué punto los conjuntos de datos del MRC evalúan la comprensión de las relaciones explícitas del discurso. Definimos siete habilidades de MRC que requieren la comprensión de las diferentes relaciones del discurso. Luego introducimos métodos de ablación que verifican si estas habilidades son necesarias para tener éxito en un conjunto de datos. Al observar la caída en el rendimiento de los modelos MRC neuronales evaluados en el conjunto de datos original y modificado, podemos medir hasta qué punto el conjunto de datos requiere estas habilidades, para que se entienda correctamente. Los experimentos en tres conjuntos de datos a gran escala con el modelo BERT-base y Albert-XXLarge muestran que los cambios relativos para todas las habilidades son pequeños (menos del 6%). Estos resultados implican que la mayoría de las preguntas respondidas en los conjuntos de datos examinados no requieren la comprensión de la estructura discursiva del texto. Para investigar específicamente la comprensión del lenguaje natural, es necesario diseñar puntos de referencia más desafiantes que puedan evaluar correctamente las habilidades deseadas.', 'pt': 'Uma análise aprofundada do nível de compreensão da linguagem exigida pelos benchmarks de Machine Reading Comprehension (MRC) existentes pode fornecer informações sobre os recursos de leitura das máquinas. Neste artigo, propomos uma metodologia baseada em ablação para avaliar até que ponto os conjuntos de dados do MRC avaliam a compreensão das relações de discurso explícitas. Definimos sete habilidades de MRC que requerem a compreensão de diferentes relações discursivas. Em seguida, introduzimos métodos de ablação que verificam se essas habilidades são necessárias para ter sucesso em um conjunto de dados. Observando a queda no desempenho dos modelos MRC neurais avaliados no conjunto de dados original e modificado, podemos medir até que ponto o conjunto de dados requer essas habilidades para ser entendido corretamente. Experimentos em três conjuntos de dados de grande escala com o modelo BERT-base e ALBERT-xxlarge mostram que as mudanças relativas para todas as habilidades são pequenas (menos de 6%). Esses resultados implicam que a maioria das perguntas respondidas nos conjuntos de dados examinados não requer a compreensão da estrutura discursiva do texto. Para sondar especificamente a compreensão da linguagem natural, é necessário projetar benchmarks mais desafiadores que possam avaliar corretamente as habilidades pretendidas.', 'ja': '既存の機械読解（ MRC ）ベンチマークで必要とされる言語理解のレベルの詳細な分析は、機械の読解能力に関する洞察を提供することができます。 本稿では， MRCデータセットが明示的な言説関係の理解を評価する程度を評価するためのアブレーションに基づく方法論を提案する． 私たちは、異なる話題関係の理解を必要とする7つのMRCスキルを定義します。 次に、これらのスキルがデータセットで成功するために必要かどうかを検証するアブレーション方法を紹介します。 元のデータセットと修正されたデータセットで評価されたニューラルMRCモデルのパフォーマンスの低下を観察することにより、正しく理解されるために、データセットがこれらのスキルを必要とする程度を測定することができます。 ＢＥＲＴベース及びＡＬＢＥＲＴ － ｘｘｌａｇｅモデルを用いた３つの大規模データセットの実験では、全てのスキルの相対的変化が小さいことが示されている（ ６ ％未満）。 これらの結果は、調査されたデータセットで回答された質問のほとんどが、テキストの話題構造を理解する必要がないことを意味します。 自然言語の理解を具体的に探るためには、意図されたスキルを正しく評価できる、より困難なベンチマークを設計する必要がある。', 'zh': '今机器读解(MRC)准言深入分析,可以深知机器之能。 于本文中,立消融之法,以质MRC数显式语之解也。 定义七MRC技,须知异语关。 然后言消融之法,以验数集上之功。 观原始数据集改之数集上评神经MRC形之性降,可量数集于多大程度,以正确理解之。 用BERT-base、ALBERT-xxlarge三集之实验,诸伎皆小(小于6%)。 此结果表明,所检查数据集多端,不须解结。 专探自然语言解,须设更具挑战性基准,以正估期之能。', 'hi': 'मौजूदा मशीन रीडिंग कॉम्प्रिहेंशन (एमआरसी) बेंचमार्क द्वारा आवश्यक भाषा समझ के स्तर का गहन विश्लेषण मशीनों की पढ़ने की क्षमताओं में अंतर्दृष्टि प्रदान कर सकता है। इस पेपर में, हम एक एब्लेशन-आधारित पद्धति का प्रस्ताव करते हैं ताकि यह आकलन किया जा सके कि एमआरसी डेटासेट स्पष्ट प्रवचन संबंधों की समझ का मूल्यांकन किस हद तक करते हैं। हम सात एमआरसी कौशल को परिभाषित करते हैं जिनके लिए विभिन्न प्रवचन संबंधों की समझ की आवश्यकता होती है। फिर हम एब्लेशन विधियों को पेश करते हैं जो सत्यापित करते हैं कि डेटासेट पर सफल होने के लिए इन कौशलों की आवश्यकता है या नहीं। मूल और संशोधित डेटासेट पर मूल्यांकन किए गए तंत्रिका एमआरसी मॉडल के प्रदर्शन में गिरावट को देखकर, हम यह माप सकते हैं कि डेटासेट को सही ढंग से समझने के लिए इन कौशलों की किस हद तक आवश्यकता होती है। BERT-बेस और ALBERT-xxlarge मॉडल के साथ तीन बड़े पैमाने पर डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि सभी कौशल के लिए सापेक्ष परिवर्तन छोटे (6% से कम) हैं। इन परिणामों का तात्पर्य है कि जांच किए गए डेटासेट में उत्तर दिए गए अधिकांश प्रश्नों को पाठ की प्रवचन संरचना को समझने की आवश्यकता नहीं है। विशेष रूप से प्राकृतिक भाषा की समझ के लिए जांच करने के लिए, अधिक चुनौतीपूर्ण बेंचमार्क डिजाइन करने की आवश्यकता है जो इच्छित कौशल का सही ढंग से मूल्यांकन कर सकते हैं।', 'ru': 'Глубокий анализ уровня понимания языка, требуемого существующими критериями понимания машинного чтения (MRC), может дать представление о возможностях машинного чтения. В этой статье мы предлагаем методологию, основанную на абляции, для оценки степени, в которой наборы данных MRC оценивают понимание явных отношений дискурса. Мы определяем семь навыков MRC, которые требуют понимания различных отношений дискурса. Затем мы вводим методы абляции, которые проверяют, требуются ли эти навыки для успеха в наборе данных. Наблюдая за падением производительности нейронных моделей MRC, оцениваемых по исходному и модифицированному набору данных, мы можем измерить, в какой степени набор данных требует этих навыков, чтобы быть правильно понятыми. Эксперименты с тремя крупномасштабными наборами данных с использованием модели BERT-base и модели ALBERT-xxlarge показывают, что относительные изменения для всех навыков являются небольшими (менее 6%). Эти результаты подразумевают, что большинство вопросов, на которые были даны ответы в исследуемых наборах данных, не требуют понимания структуры дискурса текста. Чтобы конкретно проверить понимание естественного языка, необходимо разработать более сложные критерии, которые могут правильно оценить предполагаемые навыки.', 'ga': 'Is féidir le mionanailís ar an leibhéal tuisceana teanga a theastaíonn ó thagarmharcanna um Léamhthuiscint Inneall (MRC) atá ann cheana léargas a thabhairt ar chumas léitheoireachta meaisíní. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid modheolaíocht a bheidh bunaithe ar ablation chun measúnú a dhéanamh ar a mhéid a dhéanann tacair shonraí an MRC meastóireacht ar an tuiscint ar chaidreamh dioscúrsa follasach. Sainmhínímid seacht scil MRC a éilíonn tuiscint ar chaidreamh dioscúrsa éagsúla. Ansin tugaimid isteach modhanna díláithrithe a fhíoraíonn cibé an bhfuil na scileanna seo ag teastáil le go n-éireoidh leo ar thacair sonraí. Trí laghdú ar fheidhmíocht na múnlaí MRC néaracha a ndearnadh meastóireacht orthu ar an mbunachar sonraí agus ar an mbunachar sonraí modhnaithe a bhreathnú, is féidir linn a thomhas a mhéid a éilíonn an tacar sonraí na scileanna seo, chun go dtuigfear i gceart sinn. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar thrí thacar sonraí ar scála mór leis an tsamhail BERT-base agus ALBERT-xxlarge gur beag (níos lú ná 6%) na hathruithe coibhneasta do na scileanna go léir. Tugann na torthaí seo le tuiscint nach gá struchtúr dioscúrsa an téacs a thuiscint d’fhormhór na gceisteanna freagartha sna tacair sonraí a scrúdaíodh. Chun tuiscint shainiúil ar theanga nádúrtha a fhiosrú, tá gá le tagarmharcanna níos dúshlánaí a dhearadh ar féidir leo na scileanna atá beartaithe a mheas i gceart.', 'ka': 'მუშაობელი მაქსინური კომპრენქციის (MRC) კომპრენქციის კომპრენქციის კომპრენქციის კომპრენქციის კომპრენქციის დონეზე განსაზღვრებული ანალიზი შეუძლია მაქსინ ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ მინდომა გავაკეთებთ შესაძლებლობის მეტოლოგია, რომელიც MRC მონაცემების კონფიგურაციების შესახებ გავაკეთებთ. ჩვენ განსაზღვრებთ 7 MRC მეცნიერები, რომლებიც განსხვავებული განსაზღვრების შესახებ უნდა გავიგოთ. შემდეგ ჩვენ შევცვალოთ შესაძლებელი მეტოვები, რომელიც დარწმუნეთ თუ არა ეს შესაძლებელობა მონაცემების შესაძლებელობა. ჩვენ შევხედავთ ნეიროლური MRC მოდელების კონტაქტის კონტაქტის შესახებ, რომლებიც მოცემული მოდენტის კონტაქტის შესახებ, ჩვენ შეგვიძლია განზომის კონტაქტის კონტაქტის შესა BERT- ბაზის და ALBERT- xxlarge მოდელთან სამი დიდი მონაცემების გამოცდილებები ჩვენებს, რომ ყველა მეცნიერების შესაბამისი ცვლილებები პატარა (6%). ამ შედეგების შედეგება იგივეა, რომ უფრო მეტი პასუხულებული კითხვები ტექსტის დისკურსის სტრუქტურაზე არ უნდა იცოდეს. განსაკუთრებულად მოწყვეტილებისთვის თავისუფლებისთვის შესაძლებელია, რომ უფრო შესაძლებელია განსაკუთრებული ბანქმერი, რომელიც შეუძლებელია სწორად განსაკუთრებული სტაცი', 'el': 'Μια εμπεριστατωμένη ανάλυση του επιπέδου κατανόησης της γλώσσας που απαιτείται από τα υπάρχοντα σημεία αναφοράς κατανόησης της μηχανικής ανάγνωσης (μπορεί να δώσει εικόνα για τις δυνατότητες ανάγνωσης των μηχανών. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια μεθοδολογία βασισμένη στην αφαίρεση για την αξιολόγηση του βαθμού στον οποίο τα σύνολα δεδομένων αξιολογούν την κατανόηση των ρητών σχέσεων συζήτησης. Καθορίζουμε επτά δεξιότητες που απαιτούν την κατανόηση των διαφορετικών σχέσεων συζήτησης. Στη συνέχεια εισάγουμε μεθόδους αφαίρεσης που επαληθεύουν αν αυτές οι δεξιότητες απαιτούνται για να επιτύχουν σε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων. Παρατηρώντας την πτώση της απόδοσης των νευρωνικών μοντέλων που αξιολογούνται στο αρχικό και το τροποποιημένο σύνολο δεδομένων, μπορούμε να μετρήσουμε σε ποιο βαθμό το σύνολο δεδομένων απαιτεί αυτές τις δεξιότητες, προκειμένου να κατανοηθεί σωστά. Πειράματα σε τρία σύνολα δεδομένων μεγάλης κλίμακας με το μοντέλο BERT-base και ALBERT-xxlarge δείχνουν ότι οι σχετικές αλλαγές για όλες τις δεξιότητες είναι μικρές (λιγότερο από 6%). Τα αποτελέσματα αυτά υποδηλώνουν ότι τα περισσότερα από τα ερωτήματα που απαντήθηκαν στα εξετασμένα σύνολα δεδομένων δεν απαιτούν κατανόηση της δομής του λόγου του κειμένου. Για να διερευνηθεί συγκεκριμένα η κατανόηση της φυσικής γλώσσας, υπάρχει ανάγκη να σχεδιαστούν πιο απαιτητικά κριτήρια αναφοράς που μπορούν να αξιολογήσουν σωστά τις επιδιωκόμενες δεξιότητες.', 'kk': 'Машин оқу бағдарламасының (MRC) бағдарламасының талқылау деңгейінің тереңдік анализациясы машиналардың оқу мүмкіндігін көрсетеді. Бұл қағазда, МRC деректер қорларының түсініктерін анықтау үшін қолданатын көпшіліктерді негіздеген методологияны таңдаймыз. Біз жетінші МРК жұмысын анықтаймыз. Бұл әртүрлі дискурстардың қатынасын түсіну керек. Содан кейін бұл құндылықтарды бақылау әдістерін таңдап береміз. Бұл құндылықтар деректер жиынында сәтті емес пе? Невралдық MRC үлгілерін бастапқы және өзгертілген деректер жинағында оқу үшін, деректер жинағының қанша деңгейіне қалай түсінуге болады. BERT- негізі және ALBERT- xxlarge үлгі үш үлкен масштабтағы деректер жиындарының тәжірибелері барлық жәндіктердің қатынасыз өзгерістері кішкентай (6%) дегенді көрсетеді. Бұл нәтижелер тексерілген деректер қорларындағы жауап сұрақтардың көпшілігі мәтіннің дискурстардың құрылымын түсінуге қажет болмайды. Тәуелді тілді түсініктерге тәжірибе үшін, мақсатты жәндерді дұрыс бағалау мүмкіндігін дұрыс бағалауға болады.', 'hu': 'A meglévő MRC (Machine Reading Comprehension) referenciaértékek által megkövetelt nyelvértés mélyreható elemzése betekintést nyújthat a gépek olvasási képességeibe. Jelen tanulmányban ablációs alapú módszertant javasolunk annak értékelésére, hogy az MRC adatkészletek milyen mértékben értékelik az explicit diskurzus kapcsolatok megértését. Hét MRC készséget határozunk meg, amelyek megkövetelik a különböző diskurzus kapcsolatok megértését. Ezután bevezetjük az ablációs módszereket, amelyek ellenőrzik, hogy ezek a készségek szükségesek-e az adatkészleten való sikerhez. Az eredeti és a módosított adatkészleten értékelt neurális MRC modellek teljesítménycsökkenésének figyelembevételével mérhetjük, hogy az adatkészlet milyen mértékben igényli ezeket a készségeket, hogy megfelelően megértsük. A BERT-bázis és az ALBERT-xxlarge modellel végzett három nagyszabású adathalmazon végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy az összes készség relatív változása kicsi (6%-nál kevesebb). Ezek az eredmények arra utalnak, hogy a vizsgált adatkészletekben található válaszok többsége nem igényli a szöveg diskurzusszerkezetének megértését. A természetes nyelv megértésének kifejezetten vizsgálatához nagyobb kihívást jelentő referenciaértékeket kell kidolgozni, amelyek helyesen értékelhetik a tervezett készségeket.', 'it': "Un'analisi approfondita del livello di comprensione del linguaggio richiesto dai benchmark MRC (Machine Reading Comprehension) esistenti può fornire informazioni sulle capacità di lettura delle macchine. In questo articolo, proponiamo una metodologia basata sull'ablazione per valutare in che misura i dataset MRC valutano la comprensione delle relazioni esplicite del discorso. Definiamo sette competenze MRC che richiedono la comprensione delle diverse relazioni di discorso. Introdurremo quindi metodi di ablazione che verificano se queste competenze sono necessarie per avere successo su un set di dati. Osservando il calo delle prestazioni dei modelli MRC neurali valutati sul dataset originale e modificato, possiamo misurare fino a che punto il dataset richiede queste competenze, per essere compreso correttamente. Esperimenti su tre set di dati su larga scala con il modello BERT-base e ALBERT-xxlarge mostrano che i cambiamenti relativi per tutte le competenze sono piccoli (meno del 6%). Questi risultati implicano che la maggior parte delle domande risposte nei dataset esaminati non richiedono la comprensione della struttura del discorso del testo. Per sondare specificamente la comprensione del linguaggio naturale, è necessario progettare parametri più impegnativi che possano valutare correttamente le competenze previste.", 'lt': 'An in-depth analysis of the level of language understanding required by existing Machine Reading Comprehension (MRC) benchmarks can provide insight into the reading capabilities of machines.  In this paper, we propose an ablation-based methodology to assess the extent to which MRC datasets evaluate the understanding of explicit discourse relations.  Mes apibrėžiame septynis MRC įgūdžius, kuriems reikia suprasti skirtingus diskursinius santykius. Tada įvedame abliacijos metodus, kuriais tikrinama, ar šie įgūdžiai reikalingi, kad duomenų rinkinys būtų sėkmingas. Stebėdami, kad pradiniame ir modifikuotame duomenų rinkinyje įvertintų neurologinių MRC modelių veiksmingumas mažėja, galime įvertinti, kiek duomenų rinkinys reikalauja šių įgūdžių, kad jie būtų teisingai suprasti. Trys didelio masto duomenų rinkiniai su BERT baze ir ALBERT xxlarge modeliu parodė, kad santykiniai visų įgūdžių pokyčiai yra nedideli (mažiau kaip 6 %). Šie rezultatai reiškia, kad dauguma nagrinėtų duomenų rinkinių atsakytų klausimų nereikia suprasti teksto diskurso struktūros. Siekiant konkrečiai ištirti natūralaus kalbos supratimo, reikia sukurti sunkesnius lyginamuosius rodiklius, kurie galėtų teisingai įvertinti numatytus įgūdžius.', 'mk': 'Длабока анализа на нивото на разбирање на јазикот потребно од постоечките референтни значки за разбирање на читањето на машините (МРЦ) може да обезбеди разбирање за читањето на способностите на машините. Во овој документ, предложуваме методологија базирана на аблација за проценка на степенот во кој множините на податоци на МРЦ го проценуваат разбирањето на експлицитните дискурсни односи. Ние дефинираме седум МРЦ вештини кои бараат разбирање на различни дискурсни односи. Потоа воведуваме методи на аблација кои верификуваат дали овие вештини се потребни за да успеат на податоци. Со набљудување на намалувањето на резултатите на невровните модели на МРЦ оценети на оригиналниот и модифицираниот податок, можеме да мериме до кој степен податоците бараат овие вештини, за да се разбере правилно. Експериментите на три големи податоци со базата BERT и моделот ALBERT-xxlarge покажуваат дека релативните промени за сите вештини се мали (помалку од 6 отсто). Овие резултати имплицираат дека повеќето одговорени прашања во испитаните податоци не бараат разбирање на дискурсната структура на текстот. За специфична истрага за природното разбирање на јазикот, постои потреба да се дизајнираат попредизвикувачки споредби кои може да ги исправно оценат наменетите вештини.', 'ml': 'നിലവിലുള്ള മെഷീന്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ (എംആര്\u200dസി) ബെന്\u200dമെന്\u200dഗര്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ വായിക്കുവാനുള്ള ഭാഷയുടെ നിലന ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d എംആര്\u200dസി ഡാറ്റാസ്റ്റാറ്സെറ്റുകളുടെ വ്യക്തമായ സംസാര ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെ മനസ്സിനെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വ്യക്തമായി വ വ്യത്യസംസാര ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d ആവശ്യമുള്ള ഏഴ് എംആര്\u200dസി കഴിവുകള്\u200d നാം വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഡാറ്റാസറ്റില്\u200d വിജയിക്കാന്\u200d ഈ കഴിവുകള്\u200d ആവശ്യമുണ്ടോ എന്ന് പരിശോധിക്കുന്ന വഴികള്\u200d പരി ന്യൂറല്\u200d എംആര്\u200dസി മോഡലുകളുടെ പ്രദര്\u200dശനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും മാറ്റിയ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിലും വിലയിക്കപ്പെടുന്നതും കാണുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിന്റെ വ ബെര്\u200dട്ട്- ബേസിലും അല്\u200dബെര്\u200dട്ട്- എക്സ്എക്സ്പ്ലാറ്റ് മോഡലിലും മൂന്ന് വലിയ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലും പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്ക പരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഡാറ്റാസറ്റിലെ ഏറ്റവും ഉത്തരം ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d പദാവലിയുടെ സംസാര ഘടനയെ മനസ്സിലാക്കേണ്ടതില്ല എന്ന്  പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയില്\u200d മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്നതിനു വേണ്ടി പരീക്ഷിക്കേണ്ടതിനായി, നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട പരിശ', 'ms': 'Analisis mendalam aras pemahaman bahasa yang diperlukan oleh tanda pandangan Pembacaan Mesin (MRC) yang ada boleh menyediakan pandangan ke dalam kemampuan pembacaan mesin. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan metodologi berdasarkan ablasi untuk menilai ke mana set data MRC menilai pemahaman hubungan diskors yang jelas. Kami menentukan tujuh kemahiran MRC yang memerlukan pemahaman hubungan berbeza. Kemudian kita memperkenalkan kaedah ablasi yang mengesahkan sama ada keterampilan ini diperlukan untuk berjaya pada set data. Dengan memperhatikan turun dalam prestasi model MRC saraf yang diteliti pada set data asal dan yang diubahsuai, kita boleh mengukur ke mana darjah set data memerlukan keterampilan ini, untuk dipahami dengan betul. Eksperimen pada tiga set data skala besar dengan model BERT-base dan ALBERT-xxlarge menunjukkan bahawa perubahan relatif untuk semua kemampuan adalah kecil (kurang dari 6%). Hasil ini menunjukkan bahawa kebanyakan soalan yang dijawab dalam set data yang diperiksa tidak memerlukan pemahaman struktur diskors teks. Untuk menyelidiki secara khusus untuk pemahaman bahasa semulajadi, ada kebutuhan untuk merancang tanda benchmark yang lebih mencabar yang boleh menilai dengan betul kemahiran yang direncanakan.', 'mt': 'Analiżi fil-fond tal-livell ta’ fehim lingwistiku meħtieġ mill-punti ta’ riferiment eżistenti tal-Komprensjoni tal-Qari tal-Magni (MRC) tista’ tipprovdi għarfien dwar il-kapaċitajiet tal-qari tal-magni. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu metodoloġija bbażata fuq l-ablazzjoni biex nivvalutaw sa liema punt is-settijiet tad-dejta tal-MRC jivvalutaw il-fehim tar-relazzjonijiet ta’ diskors espliċiti. We define seven MRC skills which require the understanding of different discourse relations.  Imbagħad nintroduċu metodi ta’ ablazzjoni li jivverifikaw jekk dawn il-ħiliet humiex meħtieġa biex jirnexxu f’sett ta’ dejta. Bl-osservazzjoni tat-tnaqqis fil-prestazzjoni tal-mudelli tal-MRC newrali evalwati fuq is-sett tad-dejta oriġinali u modifikat, nistgħu nqisu sa liema punt is-sett tad-dejta jeħtieġ dawn il-ħiliet, sabiex nifhmu b’mod korrett. L-esperimenti fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta fuq skala kbira bil-mudell BERT-base u ALBERT-xxlarge juru li l-bidliet relattivi għall-ħiliet kollha huma żgħar (inqas minn 6 %). Dawn ir-riżultati jimplikaw li l-biċċa l-kbira tal-mistoqsijiet imwieġba fis-settijiet tad-dejta eżaminati ma jeħtieġux fehim tal-istruttura ta’ diskors tat-test. Sabiex ikun hemm sonda speċifika għall-fehim tal-lingwa naturali, hemm il-ħtieġa li jiġu ddisinjati punti ta’ riferiment aktar sfidanti li jistgħu jevalwaw korrettament il-ħiliet maħsuba.', 'mn': 'Машин унших шинжлэх ухааны түвшинд шаардлагатай хэл ойлголтын гүн гүнзгий анализ нь машинуудын унших чадварыг харуулж чадна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид MRC өгөгдлийн сангуудын тодорхой ярианы харилцааны ойлголтыг үнэлэх хэмжээний талаар шалгахын тулд шийдвэрлэх арга замыг сануулдаг. Бид 7 МРК чадварыг тодорхойлдог. Энэ нь өөр хэлэлцээний харилцааны ойлголт хэрэгтэй. Дараа нь бид эдгээр чадваруудыг өгөгдлийн санд амжилттай эсэхийг шийдэх боломжтой арга замыг илтгэнэ. Өмнөх болон өөрчлөгдсөн өгөгдлийн суурь дээр мэдрэлийн МРК загварын үйл ажиллагааны үйл ажиллагааг харахад бид өгөгдлийн суурь ямар хэмжээнд эдгээр чадваруудыг зөв ойлгохын тулд хэмжээж болно. BERT-н суурь болон ALBERT-xxlarge загвартай гурван том хэмжээний өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтууд бүх чадварын харьцаатай өөрчлөлт нь жижиг (6-аас бага) гэдгийг харуулдаг. Эдгээр үр дүн нь шалгалтын өгөгдлийн сангийн ихэнх хариулт асуултууд текстийн ярианы бүтэц ойлгох шаардлагагүй гэсэн үг юм. Байгалийн хэл ойлголтын тулд тодорхой судалгаа хийхэд зорилготой чадварыг зөв үнэлэх боломжтой илүү шаардлагатай багц загваруудыг бүтээх хэрэгтэй.', 'sr': 'Duboka analiza nivoa razumijevanja jezika zahteva postojećim kriterijama za pročitanje mašine (MRC) može pružiti uvid u sposobnosti čitanja mašina. U ovom papiru predlažemo metodologiju na osnovu ablacije da proceni mjeru u kojoj su podaci MRC-a procjenjivali razumijevanje pojasnih odnosa o diskusiji. Definiramo sedam vještina MRC-a koji zahtevaju razumevanje različitih odnosa diskusija. Onda predstavljamo metode mogućnosti koje potvrđuju da li su ovi vještine potrebne za uspjeh na setu podataka. posmatrajući pad učinkovitosti neuralnih MRC modela koji su procjenjivani na originalnom i modifikovanom setu podataka, možemo izmjeriti koliko stupnja podataka zahteva ove vještine kako bi se ispravno razumeli. Eksperimenti na tri velike baze podataka sa BERT-bazom i ALBERT-xxlarge modelom pokazuju da su relativne promene za sve veštine male (manje od 6%). Ovi rezultati znači da većina odgovornih pitanja u ispitivanim podacima ne zahteva razumevanje strukture diskursa teksta. Da bi posebno istražili prirodno razumevanje jezika, potrebna je da dizajniramo izazovne kriterije koje mogu ispravno proceniti nameravane vještine.', 'ro': 'O analiză aprofundată a nivelului de înțelegere a limbii solicitat de criteriile de referință existente pentru înțelegerea mașinilor (MRC) poate oferi o perspectivă asupra capacităților de citire ale mașinilor. În această lucrare, propunem o metodologie bazată pe ablație pentru a evalua măsura în care seturile de date MRC evaluează înțelegerea relațiilor explicite de discurs. Definim șapte abilități MRC care necesită înțelegerea diferitelor relații de discurs. Apoi introducem metode de ablație care verifică dacă aceste abilități sunt necesare pentru a reuși pe un set de date. Observând scăderea performanței modelelor MRC neurale evaluate pe setul de date original și modificat, putem măsura în ce măsură setul de date necesită aceste abilități, pentru a fi înțeles corect. Experimentele efectuate pe trei seturi de date la scară largă cu modelul BERT-base și ALBERT-xxlarge arată că modificările relative pentru toate competențele sunt mici (mai puțin de 6%). Aceste rezultate implică faptul că majoritatea întrebărilor răspunse din seturile de date examinate nu necesită înțelegerea structurii discursului textului. Pentru a verifica în mod specific înțelegerea limbii naturale, este necesar să se elaboreze criterii de referință mai dificile care să poată evalua corect abilitățile propuse.', 'no': 'Ein i dybde analyse av nivået for språk forstørring som krevst av eksisterande benchmarker for å lesa maskinen (MRC) kan gje innsikt i lesingskapasiteten for maskiner. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein metodologi basert på ablasjon for å vurdere kor mykje MRC-datasett evaluerer forståelse av eksplisitte diskursrelasjonar. Vi definerer sju MRC-kvalitetar som krev forståelse av ulike diskursrelasjonar. Vi introduserer så innstillingsmetoder som kontrollerer om desse ferdighetane er nødvendig for å velja ein datasett. Ved å sjå nedtrekking av nøyrale MRC-modeller som er evaluert på den opprinnelige og den modifiserte datasettet, kan vi måle kva grad datasettet krev desse ferdighetene for å vera rett forstått. Eksperimentar på tre store datasett med BERT- basen og ALBERT- xxlarge- modellen viser at de relative endringane for alle ferdighetane er lite (mindre enn 6%). Desse resultatene tyder på at dei fleste svarte spørsmålene i dei undersøkte datasetta treng ikkje å forstå diskursstrukturen av teksten. For å spesifikke prøve for naturspråksforståking, er det ein måte å design meir vanskeleg benchmarker som kan rett evaluera dei bestemte ferdighetane.', 'pl': 'Głęboka analiza poziomu zrozumienia języka wymaganego przez istniejące wskaźniki porozumienia odczytu maszynowego (MRC) może zapewnić wgląd w możliwości odczytu maszyn. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy metodologię opartą na ablacji oceny stopnia, w jakim zbiory danych MRC oceniają zrozumienie wyraźnych relacji dyskursowych. Definiujemy siedem umiejętności MRC, które wymagają zrozumienia różnych relacji dyskursowych. Następnie wprowadzamy metody ablacji, które sprawdzają, czy umiejętności te są wymagane do odniesienia sukcesu na zbiorze danych. Obserwując spadek wydajności neuronowych modeli MRC ocenianych na oryginalnym i zmodyfikowanym zbiorze danych, możemy zmierzyć, do jakiego stopnia zbiór danych wymaga tych umiejętności, aby być poprawnie zrozumiany. Eksperymenty na trzech dużych zbiorach danych z modelem BERT-base i ALBERT-xxlarge pokazują, że względne zmiany dla wszystkich umiejętności są niewielkie (mniej niż 6%). Wyniki te sugerują, że większość odpowiedzi w badanych zbiorach danych nie wymaga zrozumienia struktury dyskursu tekstu. Aby szczególnie badać rozumienie języka naturalnego, istnieje potrzeba opracowania bardziej wymagających wskaźników odniesienia, które mogą prawidłowo ocenić zamierzone umiejętności.', 'si': 'භාෂාව තේරුම්ගන්න අවශ්\u200dය භාෂාව ප්\u200dරවේශනය (MRC) බෙන්ච්මාර්ක්ස් වලින් අවශ්\u200dය භාෂාව විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනය මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අධාරිත විද්\u200dයාවයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ MRC දත්ත සේට් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කතා කර අපි MRC විශ්වාස කරන්නේ වෙනස් කතාවක් සම්බන්ධයේ තේරුම් අවශ්\u200dයයි. ඊට පස්සේ අපි දත්ත සෙට් එකේ සාර්ථක විදියට පරීක්ෂා කරන්න පුළුවන් විදියට පරීක්ෂා කරනවා. ප්\u200dරධාන MRC මොඩේල්ස් වලට පරීක්ෂණය සහ වෙනස් කරපු දත්ත සෙට් වලට පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ, අපිට පුළුවන් දත්ත සෙට්ටුවට මොන ඩිග්\u200d BERT- බේස් සහ ALBERT- x- ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණ දත්ත සැකසුම් තුනක් පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සියලුම වෙනස මේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ පරීක්ෂණා කරලා තියෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලි ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව තේරුම් ගන්න විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න, තව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න ඕනේ විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තිය', 'so': "Baaritaanka hoose u dheer ee heerka waxgarashada luuqada ee loo baahan yahay qoraalka qoraalka (MRC) ee heysta mashiinka akhriska (MRC) waxay muujin kartaa waxgarashada akhriska awoodda mashiinadaha. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa qaabab ah oo ku saleysan daboolidda si aan u qiimeyno hadba waqtiga macluumaadka MRC ay ku qiimeeyaan garashada xiriirka cad ee hadalka. We define seven MRC skills which require the understanding of different discourse relations.  Markaas waxaynu soo bandhignaa qaabab awoodda, si aan u xaqiijinno in xirfadahan looga baahan yahay in lagu liibaano kooxda macluumaadka. Markii aan arkayno drop-ka sameynta modellada neurada ee MRC oo lagu qiimeeyo asalka iyo sawirada cusub, waxaan ku qiyaasi karnaa shahaadada macluumaadka looga baahan yahay aqoontan si loo garto si hagaagsan. Imtixaanka ku qoran saddexda databases oo waaweyn oo ku qoran BERT-base iyo ALBERT-xxxlarge waxay muujiyaan in beddelka qaraabada ee aqoonta oo dhan ay yar yihiin (wax ka yar 6%). Sababadahan waxaa loola jeedaa in jawaabta badankood oo ka mid ah su'aalaha la imtixaamay looma baahna inay fahanto qoraalka qoraalka. Si gaar ah loo tijaabiyo waxgarashada afka dabiiciga ah, waxaa loo baahan yahay in la sameeyo qiimeynta qiimeynta aqoonta lagu talo galay.", 'sv': 'En djupgående analys av den språkförståelse som krävs av befintliga MRC-riktmärken (Machine Reading Comprehension) kan ge insikt i maskinernas läsförmåga. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en ablationsbaserad metod för att bedöma i vilken utsträckning MRC-datauppsättningar utvärderar förståelsen av explicita diskursrelationer. Vi definierar sju MRC färdigheter som kräver förståelse för olika diskursrelationer. Vi introducerar sedan ablationsmetoder som verifierar om dessa färdigheter krävs för att lyckas på en dataset. Genom att observera nedgången i prestanda hos neurala MRC-modeller utvärderade på original och modifierad datauppsättning kan vi mäta i vilken grad datauppsättningen kräver dessa färdigheter, för att kunna förstås korrekt. Experiment på tre storskaliga datauppsättningar med BERT-basen och ALBERT-xxlarge-modellen visar att de relativa förändringarna för alla färdigheter är små (mindre än 6%). Resultaten tyder på att de flesta besvarade frågorna i de undersökta datauppsättningarna inte kräver förståelse för textens diskursstruktur. För att specifikt undersöka naturlig språkförståelse finns det ett behov av att utforma mer utmanande riktmärken som kan korrekt utvärdera de avsedda färdigheterna.', 'ur': 'موجود ماشین پڑھنے کی کمپریشن (MRC) کے ذریعے لازم ہے زبان سمجھنے کی سطح کی ایک عمیق تحلیل ہے جو ماشین کے پڑھنے کے قابلیت میں بصیرت حاصل کرسکتا ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک آبلیٹ کی بنیاد رسالہ کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ MRC ڈیٹ سٹ کس طرح مفصل کریں کہ صریح گفتگو کے ارتباط کا سمجھ ہے۔ ہم سات MRC کائنات مقرر کرتے ہیں جو مختلف صحبت کے ارتباط کو سمجھنے کی ضرورت رکھتے ہیں. اس کے بعد ہم قابلیت طریقوں کو پیش کریں جو تصدیق کریں کہ ان کا استعداد ایک ڈاٹ سٹ پر کامیاب ہونے کے لئے ضرورت ہے. نیورال MRC موڈل کے عملکرد کے ڈوبنے کو دیکھتے ہیں جو اصلی اور بدل دیے ہوئے ڈاٹ سٹ پر ارزش کیا گیا ہے، ہم کس طرح ڈاٹ سٹ کے اندازے کا اندازہ کرسکتے ہیں کہ ان کی استعدادوں کو درست سمجھ سکیں۔ BERT-base اور ALBERT-xxlarge موڈل کے ساتھ تین بڑے اسکیل ڈاٹ سٹ کے تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ تمام طاقتوں کے ساتھ نسبت تغییر چھوٹے ہیں (6%) سے کم۔ یہ نتائج یہی ہے کہ اکثر جواب دینے والی سوالوں میں سے متوجہ ہونے کی ضرورت نہیں ہے. طبیعی زبان سمجھنے کے لئے مخصوص تحقیق کرنے کے لئے، زیادہ مشکل سنچم مارک طراحی کرنے کی ضرورت ہے جو مطابق مقرر کردہ کائنات کو درست تحقیق کر سکتے ہیں.', 'ta': 'Name இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு முழுமையான முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் எம்ஆர்சி தரவு அமைப்புகள் எத்தனை அளவை மதிப்பிடுகிறது வெளிப்பட நாம் ஏழு MRC திறமைகளை வரையறுக்கிறோம். இது வேறு பேச்சு உறவுகளை புரிந்து கொள்ள வேண்டும். பின்னர் இந்த திறமைகள் ஒரு தரவு அமைப்பில் வெற்றியடைய வேண்டுமா என்று சரிபார் மூலத்தில் மற்றும் மாற்றப்பட்ட தரவு அமைப்பில் மதிப்பிடப்பட்ட புதிய MRC மாதிரிகளின் செயல்பாட்டின் குறைவை பார்த்து, சரியாக புரிந்து கொள்ள BERT- அடிப்படையிலும் ALBERT- xxபெரிய மாதிரியிலும் மூன்று பெரிய அளவு தரவுத்தளத்திலும் சோதனைகள் எல்லா திறமைகளுக்கும் சார்ந்த மாற் இந்த முடிவுகள் சோதிக்கப்பட்ட தரவுத்தளங்களில் பெரும்பாலான பதில் கேள்விகள் உரையின் பேச்சு உரையின் உரையை புரி இயற்கையான மொழி புரிந்து கொள்ள வேண்டும் என்று குறிப்பிட்டு சோதிக்க வேண்டும், நேர்ந்த த திட்டத்திற்கு சரியாக', 'uz': "Name Bu qogʻozda, biz ma'lumotlar muvaffaqiyatlarni aniqlashga MRC maʼlumotlar tarkibini tasavvur qilish uchun asosiy usulni anglatamiz. Biz har xil munosabatlarni o'rganish kerak bo'lgan 7 MRC ta'sirini aniqlaysiz. Keyin biz maʼlumotlar sohasida muvaffaqiyatli kerak bo'lganligini tekshirish usullarni ko'rsamiz. Asl va oʻzgarilgan maʼlumotlar tarkibida qiymatli neyron MRC modellarini bajarishni ko'rib turib, biz maʼlumotlar tarkibini to ʻgʻri tushunish mumkin. Name Ushbu natijalar imkoniyatini ko'pchilik taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi javoblar matnning soʻzni tushirish kerak emas. Tafsilotni o'rganish uchun aslida tilni tushunish uchun qanday qiymati kerak. Bu qo'llanmalarni saqlash mumkin.", 'vi': 'Một cuộc phân tích sâu sắc về mức độ hiểu biết ngôn ngữ cần thiết bởi khả năng đo lường trên cỗ máy đã có (MRX) có thể cung cấp thông tin về khả năng đọc của máy. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp xóa bỏ để đánh giá mức độ các tập tin của MRX đánh giá sự hiểu biết về các mối quan hệ đàm luận trực tiếp. Chúng tôi xác định bảy kỹ năng MRC cần sự hiểu biết của các mối quan hệ đối thoại khác nhau. Sau đó chúng tôi sẽ áp dụng phương pháp xóa bỏ để xác định xem những kỹ năng này có cần thiết để thành công trên một bộ dữ liệu không. Bằng cách quan sát sự giảm sút khả năng của các mô hình MRC thần kinh được đánh giá trên bộ dữ liệu gốc và đã sửa đổi, chúng ta có thể đo được mức độ của bộ dữ liệu cần những kỹ năng này, để được hiểu đúng. Thí nghiệm trên ba tập đoàn dữ liệu quy mô lớn với nền BERT và ALBERT-xx-xa cho thấy rằng thay đổi tương đối đối của tất cả các kỹ năng đều nhỏ bé (ít hơn sáu người). Những kết quả này ngụ ý rằng hầu hết các câu hỏi trả lời trong các tập tin đã xem xét không cần thiết phải hiểu cấu trúc ngôn ngữ của văn bản. Để tìm hiểu kỹ ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, cần thiết lập những tiêu chuẩn đầy thử thách để đánh giá chính xác các kỹ năng được sắp đặt.', 'bg': 'Задълбочен анализ на нивото на езиково разбиране, изисквано от съществуващите показатели за разбиране на машинното четене (МРС), може да даде представа за възможностите за четене на машините. В настоящата статия предлагаме аблационна методология за оценка на степента, в която наборите от данни на ДПС оценяват разбирането на експлицитните дискурсни отношения. Определяме седем умения на ДПС, които изискват разбиране на различните дискурсни отношения. След това въвеждаме методи за аблация, които проверяват дали тези умения са необходими за успех на набор от данни. Наблюдавайки спада в ефективността на невронните модели на ОМР, оценени на оригиналния и модифицирания набор от данни, можем да измерим до каква степен наборът от данни изисква тези умения, за да бъде правилно разбран. Експериментите върху три мащабни набора от данни с модела BERT-база и ALBERT-xxlarge показват, че относителните промени за всички умения са малки (по-малко от 6%). Тези резултати предполагат, че повечето от отговорените въпроси в изследваните набори от данни не изискват разбиране на дискурсната структура на текста. За конкретно проучване за разбиране на естествения език е необходимо да се разработят по-предизвикателни показатели, които могат правилно да оценят предвидените умения.', 'da': 'En dybdegående analyse af niveauet af sprogforståelse, der kræves af eksisterende MRC-benchmarks (Machine Reading Comprehension) kan give indsigt i maskinernes læsefunktioner. I denne artikel foreslår vi en ablation-baseret metode til at vurdere, i hvilket omfang MRC datasæt vurderer forståelsen af eksplicitte diskursrelationer. Vi definerer syv MRC færdigheder, som kræver forståelse af forskellige diskursrelationer. Vi introducerer derefter ablationsmetoder, der verificerer, om disse færdigheder er nødvendige for at lykkes på et datasæt. Ved at observere faldet i ydeevne af neurale MRC modeller evalueret på det oprindelige og det modificerede datasæt, kan vi måle i hvilken grad datasættet kræver disse færdigheder, for at blive forstået korrekt. Eksperimenter med tre store datasæt med BERT-base- og ALBERT-xxlarge-modellen viser, at de relative ændringer for alle færdigheder er små (mindre end 6%). Disse resultater indebærer, at de fleste af de besvarede spørgsmål i de undersøgte datasæt ikke kræver forståelse af tekstens diskursstruktur. For specifikt at undersøge for naturlig sprogforståelse er der behov for at designe mere udfordrende benchmarks, der kan vurdere de tilsigtede færdigheder korrekt.', 'hr': 'Duboka analiza razine razumijevanja jezika potrebne od postojećih kriterija za pročitanje strojeva (MRC) može pružiti uvid u sposobnosti čitanja strojeva. U ovom papiru predlažemo metodologiju na temelju ablacije kako bi procijenili mjeru u kojoj su podaci MRC-a procjenjivali razumijevanje pojasnih odnosa o diskusiji. Definiramo sedam vještina MRC-a koji zahtijevaju razumijevanje različitih odnosa diskusija. Onda predstavljamo metode omogućivanja koje potvrđuju da li su te vještine potrebne za uspjeh na setu podataka. Gledajući pad učinkovitosti neuralnih MRC-ovih modela koji su procijenjeni na originalnom i modificiranom sastavu podataka, možemo mjeriti koliko stupnja podataka zahtijeva te vještine kako bi se ispravno razumijeli. Eksperimenti na tri velike baze podataka s BERT-bazom i ALBERT-xxlarge modelom pokazuju da su relativne promjene za sve vještine male (manje od 6%). Te rezultate znači da većina odgovornih pitanja u ispitivanim podacima ne zahtijevaju razumijevanje strukture diskursa teksta. Da bi posebno istražili prirodno razumijevanje jezika, potrebno je dizajnirati izazovne kriterije koje mogu ispravno procijeniti namjerene vještine.', 'nl': 'Een diepgaande analyse van het taalniveau dat vereist is door bestaande benchmarks voor Machine Reading Comprehension (MRC) kan inzicht geven in de leesmogelijkheden van machines. In dit artikel stellen we een ablatie-gebaseerde methodologie voor om te beoordelen in hoeverre MRC datasets het begrip van expliciete discoursrelaties evalueren. We definiëren zeven MRC vaardigheden die het begrijpen van verschillende discoursrelaties vereisen. Vervolgens introduceren we ablatiemethoden die verifiëren of deze vaardigheden nodig zijn om te slagen op een dataset. Door het observeren van de daling in prestaties van neurale MRC modellen geëvalueerd op de originele en de gewijzigde dataset, kunnen we meten in hoeverre de dataset deze vaardigheden vereist om correct begrepen te worden. Experimenten op drie grootschalige datasets met het BERT-base en ALBERT-xxlarge model tonen aan dat de relatieve veranderingen voor alle vaardigheden klein zijn (minder dan 6%). Deze resultaten impliceren dat de meeste van de beantwoorde vragen in de onderzochte datasets geen begrip van de discoursstructuur van de tekst vereisen. Om specifiek te onderzoeken naar het begrijpen van natuurlijke taal, is het nodig om meer uitdagende benchmarks te ontwerpen die de beoogde vaardigheden correct kunnen evalueren.', 'fa': 'یک تحلیل عمیقی از سطح درک زبانی که لازم است از طریق برچسب\u200cهای خواندن ماشین موجود (MRC) می\u200cتواند به توانایی خواندن ماشین مشاهده دهد. در این کاغذ، ما یک روش\u200cشناسی بر اساس فعالیت پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا مقدار ارزیابی داده\u200cهای MRC درک رابطه\u200cهای مشخص را ارزیابی کند. ما هفت مهارت MRC را تعریف می\u200cکنیم که نیاز دارند درک رابطه\u200cهای مختلف صحبت کنند. سپس روش\u200cهای قابلیت را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که تصدیق می\u200cکنند آیا این مهارت\u200cها برای موفقیت در مجموعه\u200cی داده\u200cها نیاز دارند. با نگاه کردن کاهش عملکرد مدلهای MRC عصبی که بر روی مجموعه اصلی و داده های تغییر داده شده ارزش داده شده، می توانیم به چه درجهی که مجموعه داده ها به این مهارت نیاز دارند اندازه گیری کنیم تا به درستی درک شوند. تجربه\u200cها در سه مجموعه داده\u200cهای مقیاس بزرگ با مدل BERT-base و ALBERT-xxlarge نشان می\u200cدهند که تغییرات نسبتی برای همه مهارت کوچک (کمتر از ۶%) هستند. این نتیجه معنی است که بیشتر سوال جواب در مجموعه داده\u200cهای تحقیق نیاز به فهمیدن ساختار گفته\u200cهای متن نیست. برای تحقیق مشخص برای درک زبان طبیعی، نیازی برای طراحی نقشه\u200cهای مشکلی بیشتری وجود دارد که می\u200cتوانند مهارت\u200cهای هدف را درست ارزیابی کنند.', 'de': 'Eine eingehende Analyse des Sprachverständnisses, der von bestehenden MRC-Benchmarks (Machine Reading Comprehension) gefordert wird, kann einen Einblick in die Lesefähigkeiten von Maschinen geben. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine ablationsbasierte Methodik vor, um zu beurteilen, inwieweit MRC-Datensätze das Verständnis expliziter Diskursbeziehungen bewerten. Wir definieren sieben MRC-Fähigkeiten, die das Verständnis verschiedener Diskursbeziehungen erfordern. Anschließend führen wir Ablationsmethoden ein, die überprüfen, ob diese Fähigkeiten erforderlich sind, um auf einem Datensatz erfolgreich zu sein. Durch die Beobachtung des Leistungsabfalls neuronaler MRC-Modelle, die auf dem ursprünglichen und dem modifizierten Datensatz ausgewertet wurden, können wir messen, inwieweit der Datensatz diese Fähigkeiten benötigt, um richtig verstanden zu werden. Experimente an drei großen Datensätzen mit dem Modell BERT-Basis und ALBERT-xxlarge zeigen, dass die relativen Veränderungen für alle Fähigkeiten gering sind (weniger als 6%). Diese Ergebnisse implizieren, dass die meisten der in den untersuchten Datensätzen beantworteten Fragen kein Verständnis der Diskursstruktur des Textes erfordern. Um das Verständnis natürlicher Sprache gezielt zu untersuchen, müssen anspruchsvollere Benchmarks entworfen werden, die die beabsichtigten Fähigkeiten korrekt bewerten können.', 'id': 'Analisis mendalam dari tingkat pemahaman bahasa yang diperlukan oleh benchmark Pembacaan Mesin (MRC) yang ada dapat menyediakan penglihatan ke dalam kemampuan pembacaan mesin. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan metodologi berdasarkan ablasi untuk menilai jangkauan dataset MRC menilai pemahaman hubungan diskors eksplisit. We define seven MRC skills which require the understanding of different discourse relations.  Kemudian kita memperkenalkan metode ablasi yang memverifikasi apakah keterampilan ini diperlukan untuk berhasil pada set data. Dengan memperhatikan turun dalam prestasi model MRC saraf yang diteliti pada set data yang asli dan modifikasi, kita dapat mengukur seberapa tingkat dataset memerlukan keterampilan ini, untuk dipahami dengan benar. Eksperimen pada tiga set data skala besar dengan base BERT dan model ALBERT-xxlarge menunjukkan bahwa perubahan relatif untuk semua keterampilan adalah kecil (kurang dari 6%). Hasil ini menunjukkan bahwa kebanyakan pertanyaan yang dijawab dalam set data yang diperiksa tidak membutuhkan pemahaman struktur diskors teks. Untuk menyelidiki secara spesifik untuk pemahaman bahasa alam, ada kebutuhan untuk merancang benchmarks yang lebih menantang yang dapat mengevaluasi dengan benar keterampilan yang dimaksud.', 'ko': '기존 기계독해(MRC) 기준에 필요한 언어 이해 수준을 심층 분석해 기계의 독해 능력을 깊이 있게 이해할 수 있다.본고에서 우리는 융해를 바탕으로 MRC 데이터 집합이 현저한 언어 관계에 대한 이해 정도를 평가하는 방법을 제시했다.우리는 서로 다른 언어 관계를 이해해야 하는 7가지 MRC 기교를 정의했다.그리고 이 기능들이 데이터 집합에서 성공할 필요가 있는지 검증하기 위해 융해 방법을 소개한다.원본 데이터 세트의 성능을 정확하게 이해하기 위해서는 원본 데이터 세트에서 이러한 성능을 수정하고 MRC의 순서에 따라 평가해야 한다.세 개의 대형 데이터 집합에서 BERT-base와ALBERT-xxlarge 모델을 사용한 실험은 모든 기능의 상대적인 변화가 6%보다 적다는 것을 나타냈다.이러한 결과에 따르면 연구한 데이터가 집중되어 있는 대부분의 응답자들은 텍스트의 문장 구조를 이해할 필요가 없다.자연 언어의 이해를 전문적으로 탐색하기 위해서는 더욱 도전적인 기준을 설계하여 기대 기능을 정확하게 평가해야 한다.', 'af': "'n In-diepte analiseer van die vlak van taal verstanding wat benodig word deur bestaande Masjien Lees Komprimensie (MRC) benchmarke kan aansig verskaf binne die lees kapabiliteite van masjiene. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n ablasie-gebaseerde metodologie om die uitbreiding waarop MRC datastelle die verstanding van eksplisiese diskurse relasies evalueer. Ons definieer sewe MRC kunstenaars wat die verstanding van verskillende diskurse relasies nodig. Ons introduseer dan ablasie metodes wat bevestig of hierdie kunstenaars benodig is om op 'n datastel te suksesvol. Deur die afval in prestasie van neurale MRC-modele wat op die oorspronklike en die verander datastel evalueer is, kan ons maat tot watter grad die datastel hierdie verstandighede vereis om reg te verstaan. Eksperimente op drie groot- skaal datastelle met die BERT- base en ALBERT- xxlarge model vertoon dat die relatiewe veranderinge vir alle kunstenaars klein is (minder as 6%). Hierdie resultate beteken dat die meeste van die geantwoorde vrae in die ondersoekte datastelle nie verstaan die diskursstruktuur van die teks nie. Om spesifieke probeer vir natuurlike taal verstanding, is daar 'n nodig om meer pragtige benchmarke te ontwerp wat die bedoelde kunstenaars korrek kan evalueer.", 'am': 'የቋንቋ ማስተዋል ግንኙነትን በአስገኘው መሳሪያን አነብብ (MRC) benchmarks በሚያስፈልገው የቋንቋ ማስተዋል ጥልቅ አስተያየት መሆኑን በመስኮቶች ማነብ ኃይል ማቅረብ ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ የኢንተርኔት ግንኙነት ግንኙነትን የሚያስተውለውን የMRC ዳታተሮችን በማስተካከል እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የልዩ ንግግር ግንኙነት ማስተዋል የሚያስፈልጋቸውን ሰባት MRC ባለ ብልሃት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በዚያን ጊዜም እነዚህን ባለ ብልሃቶች በዳታ ማድረግ እንዲያስፈልጉት እናስታውቃለን፡፡ በመጀመሪያው እና በተለወጠው የዳታ ሰርቨሮች በሚያስተካክሉ የነጥብ MRC ዓይነቶች አካሄዱን በማየት እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ BERT-መቀመጫው እና ALBERT-xx-ትልቅ ሞዴል ላይ ሦስት ትልቅ ዳታዎች ፈተናዎች ለሁሉም ብልሃት ለውጦች ትንሽ (ከ6 በመቶ ያነሳሉ) እንዲያሳያቸው ነው፡፡ እነዚህ ፍሬዎች በተፈታተኑት ዳታዎች ውስጥ ብዙዎቹ የመልሱት ጥያቄዎች የጽሑፉን የንግግር ሥርዓት ለማስተዋል አያስፈልጋቸውም፡፡ ለፍጥረቱ ቋንቋ ማስተዋል ለመፈለግ፣ የተሰበሰቡትን እውቀት በማስተካከል የሚችል የበለጠ አቃላፊዎችን መግለጽ ያስፈልጋል፡፡', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa kina wa kiwango cha kuelewa lugha kinachohitajika na bendera zilizopo kwenye Mashine ya Kusoma Kusoma (MRC) inaweza kutoa ufahamu wa kusoma uwezo wa mashine. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza mbinu za msingi wa mwanzilisho ili kutathmini kiwango cha taarifa za MRC kutathmini uelewa wa mahusiano ya wazi ya mazungumzo. Tunafafanua ujuzi saba wa MRC ambao unahitaji kuelewa mahusiano tofauti ya mazungumzo. Kisha tunaweka mbinu za mabomu zinazothibitisha kama ujuzi huu unahitajika kufanikiwa kwenye seti ya taarifa. Kwa kuangalia tone la kutekeleza mifano ya MRC ya ubongo unaotathmini katika seti ya asili na ya mabadiliko ya data, tunaweza kupima kiwango kinachohitaji ujuzi huu, ili kuelewa sahihi. Majaribio kwenye seti za takwimu tatu kubwa yenye mfumo wa BERT na ALBERT-xxx mkubwa unaonyesha kwamba mabadiliko ya karibu kwa ujuzi wote ni ndogo (chini ya asilimia 6). Matokeo haya yanamaanisha kwamba maswali mengi yaliyojibu katika seti za taarifa zilizochunguzwa hazihitaji kuelewa muundo wa mazungumzo ya maandishi. Ili kuthibitisha kwa ufahamu wa lugha ya asili, kuna haja ya kutengeneza kanuni zenye changamoto zaidi ambazo zinaweza kutathmini ujuzi unaotarajiwa.', 'sq': 'Një analizë e thellë e nivelit të kuptimit gjuhësor të kërkuar nga normat ekzistuese të Përkuptimit të Leximit të Makinës (MRC) mund të sigurojë kuptim në aftësitë e leximit të makinave. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një metodologi bazuar në ablacion për të vlerësuar shkallën në të cilën sistemet e të dhënave MRC vlerësojnë kuptimin e marrëdhënieve të shprehura diskursore. Ne përcaktojmë shtatë aftësi MRC që kërkojnë kuptimin e marrëdhënieve të ndryshme diskursore. Pastaj futim metoda ablacioni që verifikojnë nëse këto aftësi janë të nevojshme për të suksessuar në një set të dhënash. Duke vëzhguar rënien e performancës së modeleve neuronale MRC të vlerësuar në grupin origjinal dhe të modifikuar të të dhënave, ne mund të matni në çfarë shkallë grupi i të dhënave kërkon këto aftësi, me qëllim që të kuptohet korrekt. Eksperimentet në tre grupe të dhënash në shkallë të madhe me bazën BERT dhe modelin ALBERT-xxlarge tregojnë se ndryshimet relative për të gjitha aftësitë janë të vogla (më pak se 6%). Këto rezultate nënkuptojnë se shumica e pyetjeve të përgjigjura në të dhënat e shqyrtuara nuk kërkojnë kuptimin e strukturës së diskursit të tekstit. Për të kërkuar veçanërisht për kuptimin natyror të gjuhës, ekziston një nevojë për të dizajnuar parametra më sfiduese që mund të vlerësojnë saktësisht aftësitë e synuara.', 'az': 'Mevcut maşın oxumaq müəyyənləşdirilməsi (MRC) benchmarkləri ilə ehtiyacı olan dil anlama səviyyəsinin derinlikli analizi maşınların oxumaq qabiliyyətlərinə nəzər verə bilər. Bu kağızda, MRC verilənlərin müəyyən etdiyi açıq-aydın diskurs əlaqələrinin anlaşılmasını değerləşdirmək üçün ablasiya tabanlı bir metodoloji təklif edirik. Biz yeddi MRC yetkinliklərini təsdiqləyirik ki, müxtəlif söhbətlər haqqında anlaması lazımdır. Sonra verilən qurbanların başarılı olması üçün bu yetenekliklərin təsdiqlənməsini təsdiqləyən qüvvət metodlarını təşkil edirik. Nöral MRC modellərin düşüşünü gözləyirik ki, orijinal və dəyişdirilmiş verilənlər qutusunda değerlendirilmiş, verilənlər qutusunun nə dərəcəsinə qədər ehtiyacı ola bilər ki, doğru anlaya biləsiniz. BERT-bazı və ALBERT-xxlarge modeli ilə üç böyük ölçülü veri qurularında təcrübələr bütün yetenekliklərin relativ dəyişikliklərinin kiçik olduğunu göstərir. Bu sonuçlar, çözülmüş verilənlərin çoxunun cavab verilən suallarının məktubun söhbətlərinin strukturasını anlaması lazımdır. Doğal dillərin anlaşılması üçün müəyyən edilməsi üçün, fikirləşdirilmiş yetkinlikləri düzgün değerləşdirə bilən daha çətin benchmarkları tasarlamaq lazımdır.', 'bn': 'বিদ্যমান মেশিন পাঠ করার (এমআরসি) বেনমেন্যার্ক (এমআরসি) মেশিনের পড়তে পারে যে ভাষা বুঝতে প্রয়োজনীয় পর্যায়ের গভীরভাবে বিশ্লেষণ করা যায় In this paper, we propose an ablation-based methodology to assess the extent to which MRC datasets evaluate the understanding of explicit discourse relations.  আমরা সাতটি এমআরসি দক্ষতা নির্ধারণ করি যা বিভিন্ন কথোপকথন সম্পর্কের বুঝতে চায়। তারপর আমরা আগুনের পদ্ধতি পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই যাতে পরীক্ষা করা যায় যে এই দক্ষতা কি ডাটাসেটে সফল হবে কিনা। By observing the drop in performance of neural MRC models evaluated on the original and the modified dataset, we can measure to what degree the dataset requires these skills, in order to be understood correctly.  বেরেট-বেস এবং ALBERT-xxবড় মডেল দিয়ে তিনটি বড় স্ক্যালের ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে সকল দক্ষতার আত্মিক পরিবর্তন ছোট (৬ শতাংশের এই ফলাফল হচ্ছে যে পরীক্ষা করা তথ্য সংক্রান্ত প্রশ্নের বেশীরভাগ প্রশ্ন লেখার কথোপকথন কাঠামো বুঝতে পারে না। বিশেষ করে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা বুঝতে পারার জন্য, আরো চ্যালেঞ্জিক বেনম্যাকের ডিজাইনের প্রয়োজন আছে যা সঠিকভাবে পরিকল্পনা করা', 'bs': 'Duboka analiza nivoa razumijevanja jezika potrebne od postojećih kriterija komprencije mašine za čitanje (MRC) može pružiti uvid u sposobnosti čitanja mašina. U ovom papiru predlažemo metodologiju na osnovu ablacije da proceni mjeru u kojoj su podaci MRC-a procjenjivali razumijevanje pojasnih odnosa o diskusiji. Definiramo sedam vještina MRC-a koji zahtijevaju razumijevanje različitih odnosa diskusija. Onda predstavljamo metode sposobnosti koje potvrđuju da li su ovi vještine potrebne za uspjeh na setu podataka. posmatrajući pad učinkovitosti neuralnih MRC modela procjene na originalnom i modificiranom setu podataka, možemo mjeriti koliko stupnja podataka zahtijeva te vještine kako bi se ispravno razumijeli. Eksperimenti na tri velike baze podataka sa BERT-bazom i ALBERT-xxlarge modelom pokazuju da su relativne promjene za sve vještine male (manje od 6%). Ovi rezultati znači da većina odgovornih pitanja u ispitivanim podacima ne zahtijevaju razumijevanje strukture diskursa teksta. Da bi konkretno istražili prirodno razumijevanje jezika, postoji potreba da dizajniramo izazovne kriterije koje mogu ispravno procijeniti namjerene vještine.', 'hy': 'Գոյություն ունի մեքենաների ընթերցման ընկալումների (ՄՌԿ) վերաբերյալ պահանջված լեզվի հասկացության մակարդակի խորը վերլուծությունը կարող է հասկանալ մեքենաների ընթերցման ունակությունները: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք աբլացիայի հիմնված մեթոդոլոգիա, որպեսզի գնահատենք, թե ինչքանով են ՄՌԿ տվյալների համակարգերը գնահատում բացատրական խոսակցության հարաբերությունների հասկացությունը: We define seven MRC skills which require the understanding of different discourse relations.  We then introduce ablation methods that verify whether these skills are required to succeed on a dataset.  By observing the drop in performance of neural MRC models evaluated on the original and the modified dataset, we can measure to what degree the dataset requires these skills, in order to be understood correctly.  Experiments on three large-scale datasets with the BERT-base and ALBERT-xxlarge model show that the relative changes for all skills are small (less than 6%).  Այս արդյունքները նշանակում են, որ վերլուծված տվյալների համակարգերի պատասխանների մեծ մասը չի պահանջում հասկանալ տեքստի խոսակցության կառուցվածքը: To specifically probe for natural language understanding, there is a need to design more challenging benchmarks that can correctly evaluate the intended skills.', 'ca': "An in-depth analysis of the level of language understanding required by existing Machine Reading Comprehension (MRC) benchmarks can provide insight into the reading capabilities of machines.  In this paper, we propose an ablation-based methodology to assess the extent to which MRC datasets evaluate the understanding of explicit discourse relations.  Definim set habilitats MRC que requereixen la comprensió de diferents relacions de discurs. We then introduce ablation methods that verify whether these skills are required to succeed on a dataset.  Observant la disminució del rendiment de models neuronàmics de ressonància magnètica evaluats en el conjunt de dades original i modificat, podem mesurar en quin grau el conjunt de dades requereix aquestes habilitats, per poder ser entendut correctament. Els experiments de tres conjunts de dades a gran escala amb el model BERT-base i ALBERT-xxlarge mostren que els canvis relativs de totes les habilitats són petits (menys del 6%). Aquests resultats impliquen que la majoria de les preguntes respostes dels conjunts de dades examinats no requereixen entendre l'estructura del discurs del text. To specifically probe for natural language understanding, there is a need to design more challenging benchmarks that can correctly evaluate the intended skills.", 'et': 'Olemasolevate masinlugemise mõistmise võrdlusaluste (MRC) nõutava keeleteadmise taseme põhjalik analüüs võib anda ülevaate masinate lugemisvõimekust. Käesolevas töös pakume välja ablatsioonipõhise metoodika, et hinnata, mil määral MRC andmekogumid hindavad selgesõnaliste diskursussuhete mõistmist. Määratleme seitse MRC oskust, mis nõuavad erinevate diskursussuhete mõistmist. Seejärel tutvustame ablatsioonimeetodeid, mis kontrollivad, kas need oskused on vajalikud andmekogumi eduks. Jälgides esialgsel ja modifitseeritud andmekogumil hinnatud närvilise MRC mudelite jõudluse vähenemist, saame mõõta, millisel määral andmekogum vajab neid oskusi, et neid õigesti mõista. Kolme suuremahulise andmekogumi katsed BERT-baasi ja ALBERT-xxlarge mudeliga näitavad, et kõigi oskuste suhtelised muutused on väikesed (alla 6%). Need tulemused viitavad sellele, et enamik uuritud andmekogumites esitatud vastustest ei nõua teksti diskursuse struktuuri mõistmist. Loodusliku keele mõistmise konkreetseks uurimiseks on vaja välja töötada keerulisemad võrdluskriteeriumid, mis suudavad kavandatud oskusi õigesti hinnata.', 'fi': 'Perusteellinen analyysi olemassa olevien Machine Reading Comprehension (MRC) -vertailuarvojen edellyttämästä kielitaidon tasosta voi antaa tietoa koneiden lukukyvystä. Tässä työssä ehdotamme ablaatioon perustuvaa metodologiaa sen arvioimiseksi, missä määrin MRC-aineistot arvioivat eksplisiittisten diskurssisuhteiden ymmärtämistä. Määrittelemme seitsemän MRC-taitoa, jotka edellyttävät erilaisten diskurssisuhteiden ymmärtämistä. Tämän jälkeen otamme käyttöön ablaatiomenetelmiä, joilla varmistetaan, tarvitaanko näitä taitoja menestymään aineistossa. Havaitsemalla alkuperäisen ja modifioidun aineiston perusteella arvioitujen neuromagneettikuvausmallien suorituskyvyn heikkenemistä voidaan mitata, missä määrin aineisto vaatii näitä taitoja ymmärtääkseen oikein. BERT-base- ja ALBERT-xxlarge-mallilla tehtyjen kolmen suuren mittakaavan aineiston kokeet osoittavat, että kaikkien taitojen suhteellinen muutos on pieni (alle 6%). Tulokset viittaavat siihen, että suurin osa tutkittujen aineistojen vastauksista ei edellytä tekstin diskurssirakenteen ymmärtämistä. Luonnonkielen ymmärtämisen tutkimiseksi on tarpeen suunnitella haastavampia vertailuarvoja, jotka pystyvät arvioimaan oikein aiotut taidot.', 'cs': 'Důkladná analýza úrovně porozumění jazyků vyžadované stávajícími referenčními měřítky pro rozumění strojového čtení (MRC) může poskytnout přehled o schopnostech čtení strojů. V tomto článku navrhujeme metodiku založenou na ablaci, která posoudí, do jaké míry MRC datové sady hodnotí porozumění explicitním diskurzním vztahům. Definujeme sedm MRC dovedností, které vyžadují porozumění různým diskurzním vztahům. Následně představíme ablační metody, které ověřují, zda jsou tyto dovednosti vyžadovány k úspěchu na datové sadě. Pozorováním poklesu výkonnosti neuronových MRC modelů hodnocených na originálním a modifikovaném datovém souboru můžeme změřit, do jaké míry datová sada tyto dovednosti vyžaduje, aby byla správně porozuměna. Experimenty na třech rozsáhlých datových souborech s modelem BERT-base a ALBERT-xxlarge ukazují, že relativní změny pro všechny dovednosti jsou malé (méně než 6%). Tyto výsledky naznačují, že většina zodpovězených otázek ve zkoumaných datových sadách nevyžaduje porozumění diskurzní struktuře textu. Pro konkrétní zkoumání porozumění přirozenému jazyku je třeba navrhnout náročnější referenční hodnoty, které mohou správně vyhodnotit zamýšlené dovednosti.', 'tr': 'Öň bar Makine Okamak Derjesi (MRC) düzmekleri tarapyndan gerek diller düşünüşiniň derejesiniň derinliki analizi maşynlaryň okamak ukyplaryna pikir edip biler. Bu kagyzda, MRC datasynyň aşyk diskusiýa baglaýyşynyň düşünmesini çözmek üçin, ablasiýa tabanly bir metodologiýany maslahat berýäris. Biz ýedi MRC ukyplary beýleki çykyş baglaşyklaryň düşünmesine gerek bolan ukyplary tassymlaýarys. Sonra, bu ukyplaryň bir datasetde başarmak üçin mümkin edilmelidigini barlaýan ýagdaýlary tanyşdyrýarys. Munuň başlangyç we üýtgeden veri setirinde nähili derejede bu ukyplary dogry düşünmek üçin, nähili derejede düşürmegi gözleyerek BERT-baz we ALBERT-xxlarge modeli bilen üç uly ölçekli maglumat düzümleriniň örän kiçi (6%)-den az däldigini görkezýär. Bu netijeler barlanýan veri setirlerinde jogaplaryň köpüsi metin diskusiýasynyň düşürmegine gerek däldir. Dogaty dil düşünmesi üçin adatça synanyşdyrmak üçin, maksadyň ukyplaryny dogry deňleşdirjek çözgütler tasarlamak gerek.', 'jv': 'deep Nang paper iki, kita supoyo sistem sing basa perusahaan kanggo nyelaraké ngerasahan kanggo ngilangno dataset MR Awak dhéwé énasai sawetara awak dhèwèké MR karo akeh sing dipulangan luwih dumadhi iki sampek. section Digawe Name Rejalaké iki dadi penting kêrung langkung akeh mbubatané surat ing dataset sing ujian ora bisa dilakon ngregani layang seneng pisan. Rasané dipunangé kanggo ngerasakno banget, ora bisa dianggap luwih nggawe gerakan kanggo nggawe kalih apik sing bisa dianggap kanggo awak dhéwé.', 'he': 'ניתוח עמוק של רמת הבנה לשפה הנדרשת על ידי נקודות הבנה לקרוא מכונות (MRC) קיימות יכול לספק הבנה לתוכניות הקריאה של מכונות. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מטדולוגיה מבוססת על התעלות כדי להעריך את המידה שבה קבוצת נתונים MRC מעריכים את ההבנה של יחסי דיבורים ברורים. We define seven MRC skills which require the understanding of different discourse relations.  ואז אנחנו מציגים שיטות אבליציה שמאמינים אם הכישורים האלה נדרשים כדי להצליח במערכת נתונים. על ידי לצפות בפיצוץ של מודלים של MRC עצביים שנערכו על המקורי והמסגר הנתונים המשתנה, אנו יכולים למדוד עד כמה מסגר הנתונים דורש את הכישורים האלה, כדי להבין נכון. ניסויים בשלושה קבוצות נתונים בקנה מידה גדולה עם בסיס BERT ומודל ALBERT-xxlarge מראים שהשינויים יחסיים לכל הכישורים הם קטנים (פחות מ-6%). התוצאות האלה מרמזות שרוב השאלות שנענו במערכות הנתונים הנבחנות לא דורשות להבין את מבנה הדיווח של הטקסט. To specifically probe for natural language understanding, there is a need to design more challenging benchmarks that can correctly evaluate the intended skills.', 'sk': 'Poglobljena analiza ravni razumevanja jezika, ki jo zahtevajo obstoječa merila strojnega branja (MRC), lahko zagotovi vpogled v bralne zmogljivosti strojev. V prispevku predlagamo metodologijo, ki temelji na ablaciji, za oceno obsega, v katerem nabori podatkov MRC ocenjujejo razumevanje eksplicitnih diskurznih relacij. Definiramo sedem veščin MRC, ki zahtevajo razumevanje različnih diskurznih odnosov. Nato uvedemo ablacijske metode, ki preverjajo, ali so te spretnosti potrebne za uspeh na naboru podatkov. Z opazovanjem zmanjšanja učinkovitosti nevronskih MRC modelov, ocenjenih na izvirnem in modificiranem naboru podatkov, lahko izmerimo, v kolikšni meri nabor podatkov potrebuje te veščine, da bi ga pravilno razumeli. Poskusi treh obsežnih podatkovnih nizov z modelom BERT-baze in ALBERT-xxlarge kažejo, da so relativne spremembe za vse spretnosti majhne (manj kot 6%). Ti rezultati kažejo, da večina odgovorjenih vprašanj v obravnavanih naborih podatkov ne zahteva razumevanja diskurzne strukture besedila. Za posebej raziskovanje razumevanja naravnega jezika je treba oblikovati zahtevnejša merila uspešnosti, ki lahko pravilno ocenijo predvidene spretnosti.', 'ha': "Ana ƙirari cikin-depth of the levels of an fahimtar harshe da aka buƙata da kimaƙin QUnicodeControlCharacter Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata hanyoyi mai ɗaukar a firam, dõmin ka ƙaddara abincin da maɓallin MRC za'a ƙaddara fahimta ga mazaɓa bayyananne. Munã bayyana mafiya yawan abinci bakwai MRC wanda ke nufin an fahimtar da fassarar magana dabam-dabam. Sa'an nan kuma za mu introduce metoden firan aiki, ko kuma za Mu tabbatar da waɗannan abinci idan an buƙata su cin nasara a kan wani tsari. Ga ka dũba ɗin cikakken misãlai na MRC na ƙarurar kwamfyuta wanda aka yi evaluated a kan asalin da aka gyare, za'a iya iya ƙayyade nau'in tsarin da aka buƙata wannan zane-zane, don a iya fahimta daidaita. Tajararin da ke kan data masu girma uku da motsi na BERT-base da alBERT-xx babba, na nuna cewa musamman masu danna da amfani da duk taƙaitacce sun ƙarami (da ƙaranci 6%). Haƙĩƙa, waɗannan matsala yana da cewa mafi yawansu da aka karɓa cikin tsarin da aka jarraba, ba su ƙayyade fahimtar maganar matsayin. Ga ka ƙayyade wajen fahimta lugha masu natsuwa, sai an buƙata wajen ƙayyade kimada masu ƙaranci da za'a iya ƙayyade kimada masu inganci da ke iya ƙayyade fikanci da aka ƙayyade.", 'bo': 'An in-depth analysis of the level of language understanding required by existing Machine Reading Comprehension (MRC) benchmarks can provide insight into the reading capabilities of machines. འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འོང་ཚོས་ལྕག་རིགས་ལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་པར་སྟོན་གྱིས་མཁའ་དབང་རྩལ་༧་གནོད་འཛིན་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་ཡིན། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རང་དབང་རྩལ་འདི་དག་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཅིག་ལ་རྒྱས་སྐྱོར་ཡོད་མིན་ནམ། By observing the drop in performance of neural MRC models evaluated on the original and the modified dataset, we can measure to what degree the dataset requires these skills, in order to be understood correctly. Name BERT-base་དང་ ALBERT-xxlarge མ་དབྱིབས་སྤྱོད་པའི་ཚད་ཆེ་བའི་གནད་སྡུད་གཞི་གསུམ་ཀྱི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་ནས་སྐྱེལ་བ་འདིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་སྐྱེལ་ཆེ་བ་དག གྲུབ་འབྲས་འདི་དག་གིས་བརྟག་དཔྱད་ཡིག་སྣོད་ནང་གི་གནད་སྤེལ་བའི་དྲི་བ་མང་ཆེ་བ་དེ་ཚོར་ཡིག་གི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་སྔ རང་བཞིན་ཡུལ་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་ཁྱད་པར་ཞིབ་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Meta-Learning for Effective Multi-task and Multilingual Modelling', 'ar': 'Meta-Learning للنمذجة الفعالة متعددة المهام واللغات', 'pt': 'Meta-aprendizagem para modelagem multitarefa e multilíngue eficaz', 'fr': 'Meta-Learning pour une modélisation multitâche et multilingue efficace', 'es': 'Meta-aprendizaje para un modelado eficaz multitarea y multilingüe', 'zh': '元学,有效者多任务多言建模', 'ja': '効果的なマルチタスクと多言語モデリングのためのメタラーニング', 'hi': 'प्रभावी बहु-कार्य और बहुभाषी मॉडलिंग के लिए मेटा-लर्निंग', 'ru': 'Метаобучение для эффективного многозадачного и многоязычного моделирования', 'ga': 'Meta-Fhoghlaim le haghaidh Samhaltú Éifeachtach Ilthasc agus Ilteangach', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Metatanulás a hatékony többfeladatos és többnyelvű modellezéshez', 'el': 'Μεταμάθηση για αποτελεσματική πολυγλωσσική μοντελοποίηση', 'it': 'Meta-Learning per una modellazione multi-task e multilingue efficace', 'kk': 'Эффективті көп тапсырмалар мен көп тілді үлгілеу үшін мета оқыту', 'lt': 'Metamokymasis veiksmingam daugiakalbiui ir daugiakalbiui modeliavimui', 'mk': 'Мета- учење за ефективно мултијазичко и мултијазичко моделирање', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള മെറ്റ- പഠിപ്പിക്കുക', 'mt': 'Meta-Tagħlim għal Mudellar Effettiv Multikompitu u Multilingwi', 'mn': 'Эффектив олон ажил, олон хэл загварын мета суралцах', 'no': 'Metalæring for effektiv multioppgåve og fleirspråk modellering', 'ro': 'Meta-învățare pentru o modelare eficientă multi-sarcină și multilingvă', 'pl': 'Meta-Learning dla efektywnego modelowania wielozadaniowego i wielojęzycznego', 'sr': 'Metanaučenje za efikasno multi-task i multi-jezičko modeliranje', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Meta-lärande för effektiv flerfunktionsmodellering och flerspråkig modellering', 'so': 'Meta-Learning for Effective Multi-task and Modelling', 'ta': 'வெளிப்படையான பல- பணி மற்றும் பல மொழி மாதிரி மாற்றத்திற்கான மெடா- கற்றல்', 'ur': 'مٹا-سیکھنے کے لئے اثرات Multi-Task اور Multilingual Modelling کے لئے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Siêu giáo dục cho hiệu quả đa công việc và đa ngôn ngữ', 'hr': 'Metanaučenje za učinkovito višestruko uzorke i multijezičko modeliranje', 'da': 'Meta-læring for effektiv multi-opgave og flersproget modellering', 'de': 'Meta-Learning für effektives Multi-Task- und Mehrsprachiges Modellieren', 'id': 'Meta-Learning for Effective Multi-task and Multilingual Modelling', 'fa': 'یادگیری Meta-Learning for Effective Multitasking and Multilingual Modeling', 'nl': 'Meta-Learning voor effectieve meertalige en meertalige modellering', 'bg': 'Метаобучение за ефективно многофункционално и многоезично моделиране', 'sw': 'Kufundisha kwa ajili ya kazi nyingi na Utoaji wa lugha nyingi', 'tr': 'Efektiv köp täblisaň we köp dilli nusgala üçin Meta-öwrenmek', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Էֆեկտիվ բազմախնդիրների և բազլեզու մոդելավորման մետասովորելը', 'az': 'Efektiv çoxlu işlər və çoxlu dil modelləri üçün Meta-Öyrənme', 'bn': 'Name', 'ko': '원 학습은 효과적인 다중 작업과 다중 언어 모델링에 사용된다', 'sq': 'Metamësim për modelimin efektiv me shumë detyra dhe shumë gjuhë', 'ca': 'Meta-Learning for Effective Multi-task and Multilingual Modelling', 'cs': 'Meta-Learning pro efektivní víceúlohové a vícejazyčné modelování', 'fi': 'Meta-oppiminen tehokkaaseen monitehtävään ja monikieliseen mallinnukseen', 'bs': 'Metanaučenje za efikasno multi-task i multi-jezičko modeliranje', 'et': 'Metaõpe tõhusaks mitmeülesandeks ja mitmekeelseks modelleerimiseks', 'sk': 'Metaučenje za učinkovito večopravilno in večjezično modeliranje', 'he': 'Name', 'jv': 'meta-Learning kanggo Effectative Multi-task lan Multilanguage model', 'ha': 'Meta-Learning for Effective Multi-task and Multilingual Modelling', 'bo': 'ནུས་པ་གཟུགས་ཅན་གྱི་སྣ་མང་བོའི་འགྲོ་སྣང་དང་སྣ་སྐད་རིགས་དབྱེ་བ་དག་གི་ལྟ་སྟངས'}
{'en': 'Natural language processing (NLP) tasks (e.g. question-answering in English) benefit from knowledge of other tasks (e.g., named entity recognition in English) and knowledge of other languages (e.g., question-answering in Spanish). Such shared representations are typically learned in isolation, either across tasks or across languages. In this work, we propose a meta-learning approach to learn the interactions between both tasks and languages. We also investigate the role of different sampling strategies used during meta-learning. We present experiments on five different tasks and six different languages from the XTREME multilingual benchmark dataset. Our meta-learned model clearly improves in performance compared to competitive baseline models that also include multi-task baselines. We also present zero-shot evaluations on unseen target languages to demonstrate the utility of our proposed model.', 'ar': 'تستفيد مهام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية (مثل الإجابة على الأسئلة باللغة الإنجليزية) من معرفة المهام الأخرى (على سبيل المثال ، التعرف على الكيانات المسماة باللغة الإنجليزية) ومعرفة اللغات الأخرى (على سبيل المثال ، الإجابة على الأسئلة باللغة الإسبانية). عادةً ما يتم تعلم مثل هذه التمثيلات المشتركة بشكل منفصل ، إما عبر المهام أو عبر اللغات. في هذا العمل ، نقترح نهج التعلم التلوي لتعلم التفاعلات بين كل من المهام واللغات. نحن نبحث أيضًا في دور استراتيجيات أخذ العينات المختلفة المستخدمة أثناء التعلم التلوي. نقدم تجارب على خمس مهام مختلفة وست لغات مختلفة من مجموعة البيانات المعيارية متعددة اللغات XTREME. من الواضح أن نموذجنا الذي تم تعلمه التلوي يحسن الأداء مقارنة بنماذج خط الأساس التنافسية التي تتضمن أيضًا خطوط أساس متعددة المهام. نقدم أيضًا تقييمات بدون طلقة على اللغات المستهدفة غير المرئية لإثبات فائدة نموذجنا المقترح.', 'es': 'Las tareas de procesamiento del lenguaje natural (PNL) (por ejemplo, preguntas y respuestas en inglés) se benefician del conocimiento de otras tareas (por ejemplo, reconocimiento de entidades nombradas en inglés) y del conocimiento de otros idiomas (por ejemplo, respuestas a preguntas en español). Por lo general, estas representaciones compartidas se aprenden de forma aislada, ya sea a través de tareas o de idiomas. En este trabajo, proponemos un enfoque de meta-aprendizaje para aprender las interacciones entre las tareas y los idiomas. También investigamos el papel de las diferentes estrategias de muestreo utilizadas durante el meta-aprendizaje. Presentamos experimentos sobre cinco tareas diferentes y seis idiomas diferentes del conjunto de datos de referencia multilingüe de XTREME. Nuestro modelo meta-aprendido mejora claramente el rendimiento en comparación con los modelos de referencia de la competencia que también incluyen líneas de base multitarea. También presentamos evaluaciones cero en idiomas de destino invisibles para demostrar la utilidad de nuestro modelo propuesto.', 'pt': 'Tarefas de processamento de linguagem natural (PLN) (por exemplo, resposta a perguntas em inglês) se beneficiam do conhecimento de outras tarefas (por exemplo, reconhecimento de entidade nomeada em inglês) e conhecimento de outros idiomas (por exemplo, resposta a perguntas em espanhol). Essas representações compartilhadas geralmente são aprendidas isoladamente, seja entre tarefas ou entre idiomas. Neste trabalho, propomos uma abordagem de meta-aprendizagem para aprender as interações entre tarefas e linguagens. Também investigamos o papel de diferentes estratégias de amostragem usadas durante a meta-aprendizagem. Apresentamos experimentos em cinco tarefas diferentes e seis idiomas diferentes do conjunto de dados de benchmark multilíngue XTREME. Nosso modelo meta-aprendido melhora claramente o desempenho em comparação com os modelos de linha de base competitivos que também incluem linhas de base multitarefa. Também apresentamos avaliações de tiro zero em linguagens de destino não vistas para demonstrar a utilidade do nosso modelo proposto.', 'fr': "Les tâches de traitement du langage naturel (PNL) (par exemple, répondre à des questions en anglais) bénéficient de la connaissance d'autres tâches (par exemple, la reconnaissance d'entités nommées en anglais) et de la connaissance d'autres langues (par exemple, la réponse aux questions en espagnol). Ces représentations partagées sont généralement apprises isolément, soit entre les tâches, soit entre les langues. Dans ce travail, nous proposons une approche de méta-apprentissage pour apprendre les interactions entre les tâches et les langues. Nous étudions également le rôle des différentes stratégies d'échantillonnage utilisées lors du méta-apprentissage. Nous présentons des expériences sur cinq tâches différentes et six langues différentes issues du jeu de données de référence multilingue XTREME. Notre modèle méta-appris améliore clairement les performances par rapport aux modèles de référence concurrents qui incluent également des références multitâches. Nous présentons également des évaluations zero-shot sur des langues cibles invisibles afin de démontrer l'utilité de notre modèle proposé.", 'ja': '自然言語処理（ ＮＬＰ ）タスク（例えば、英語での質疑応答）は、他のタスクの知識（例えば、英語での名前付きエンティティ認識）および他の言語の知識（例えば、スペイン語での質疑応答）から恩恵を受ける。このような共有表現は、通常、タスク間または言語間のいずれかで孤立して学習されます。この研究では、タスクと言語の両方の相互作用を学習するためのメタラーニングアプローチを提案します。また、メタラーニング中に使用されるさまざまなサンプリング戦略の役割についても調査します。XTREME多言語ベンチマークデータセットから5つの異なるタスクと6つの異なる言語に関する実験を紹介します。当社のメタ学習モデルは、マルチタスクベースラインも含む競合ベースラインモデルと比較して、パフォーマンスが明らかに向上します。私たちはまた、見えないターゲット言語に関するゼロショット評価を提示し、提案されたモデルの有用性を実証します。', 'zh': '自然语言治(NLP)务(如英语问)受益于他事(如英语名实体识)语言(如西班牙语问)。 此共享常跨语独学也。 此一元学以学事言语之相用也。 又考元学异采样之用。 以 XTREME 多言准数集展五异之实验。 与多任务基线争基线模,吾元学性能明显提高。 又于不见之语零次性评估,以证模形之实用性。', 'ru': 'Задачи обработки естественного языка (NLP) (например, ответы на вопросы на английском языке) выигрывают от знания других задач (например, распознавание именованных сущностей на английском языке) и знания других языков (например, ответы на вопросы на испанском языке). Такие общие представления, как правило, изучаются изолированно, либо между задачами, либо между языками. В этой работе мы предлагаем мета-обучающий подход к изучению взаимодействий как между задачами, так и языками. Мы также изучаем роль различных стратегий выборки, используемых в процессе метаобучения. Мы представляем эксперименты по пяти разным задачам и шести разным языкам из многоязычного эталонного набора данных XTREME. Наша метаобучаемая модель явно улучшает производительность по сравнению с конкурентоспособными базовыми моделями, которые также включают многозадачные базовые модели. Мы также представляем оценки с нулевым снимком на невидимых целевых языках, чтобы продемонстрировать полезность предлагаемой нами модели.', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण (एनएलपी) कार्य (जैसे अंग्रेजी में प्रश्न-उत्तर) अन्य कार्यों के ज्ञान (उदाहरण के लिए, अंग्रेजी में नामित इकाई मान्यता) और अन्य भाषाओं के ज्ञान (जैसे, स्पेनिश में प्रश्न-उत्तर) से लाभान्वित होते हैं। इस तरह के साझा अभ्यावेदन आमतौर पर अलगाव में सीखे जाते हैं, या तो कार्यों में या भाषाओं में। इस काम में, हम कार्यों और भाषाओं दोनों के बीच बातचीत सीखने के लिए एक मेटा-लर्निंग दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम मेटा-लर्निंग के दौरान उपयोग की जाने वाली विभिन्न नमूना रणनीतियों की भूमिका की भी जांच करते हैं। हम XTREME बहुभाषी बेंचमार्क डेटासेट से पांच अलग-अलग कार्यों और छह अलग-अलग भाषाओं पर प्रयोग प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हमारा मेटा-सीखा मॉडल स्पष्ट रूप से प्रतिस्पर्धी बेसलाइन मॉडल की तुलना में प्रदर्शन में सुधार करता है जिसमें बहु-कार्य बेसलाइन भी शामिल हैं। हम अपने प्रस्तावित मॉडल की उपयोगिता को प्रदर्शित करने के लिए अनदेखी लक्ष्य भाषाओं पर शून्य-शॉट मूल्यांकन भी प्रस्तुत करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Baineann tascanna próiseála teanga nádúrtha (NLP) (m.sh. freagra ceisteanna i mBéarla) leas as eolas ar thascanna eile (m.sh., aitheantas aonáin ainmnithe i mBéarla) agus eolas ar theangacha eile (m.sh. freagra ceisteanna sa Spáinnis). Is iondúil go bhfoghlaimítear a leithéid de léiriúcháin ina n-aonar, trasna tascanna nó trasna teangacha. San obair seo, molaimid cur chuige meitea-fhoghlama chun na hidirghníomhaíochtaí idir tascanna agus teangacha araon a fhoghlaim. Déanaimid imscrúdú freisin ar ról na straitéisí samplála éagsúla a úsáidtear le linn meitea-fhoghlaim. Cuirimid turgnaimh i láthair ar chúig thasc dhifriúla agus ar shé theanga dhifriúla ó thacar sonraí tagarmhairc ilteangach XTREME. Is léir go bhfeabhsaítear ár múnla meiti-fhoghlaim ó thaobh feidhmíochta i gcomparáid le samhlacha bonnlíne iomaíocha a chuimsíonn bonnlínte il-tasc freisin. Cuirimid i láthair freisin meastóireachtaí náid ar sprioctheangacha nach bhfacthas riamh cheana chun úsáid ár múnla molta a léiriú.', 'el': 'Οι εργασίες επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας (π.χ. απάντηση ερωτήσεων στα αγγλικά) επωφελούνται από τη γνώση άλλων εργασιών (π.χ. αναγνώριση ονομαστικής οντότητας στα αγγλικά) και τη γνώση άλλων γλωσσών (π.χ. απάντηση ερωτήσεων στα ισπανικά). Τέτοιες κοινές αναπαραστάσεις μαθαίνονται συνήθως μεμονωμένα, είτε σε όλες τις εργασίες είτε σε όλες τις γλώσσες. Στην εργασία αυτή, προτείνουμε μια προσέγγιση μετα-μάθησης για την εκμάθηση των αλληλεπιδράσεων μεταξύ των καθηκόντων και των γλωσσών. Ερευνούμε επίσης το ρόλο των διαφορετικών στρατηγικών δειγματοληψίας που χρησιμοποιούνται κατά τη διάρκεια της μετα-μάθησης. Παρουσιάζουμε πειράματα σε πέντε διαφορετικές εργασίες και έξι διαφορετικές γλώσσες από το πολύγλωσσο σύνολο δεδομένων αναφοράς. Το μετα-μαθημένο μοντέλο μας βελτιώνει σαφώς την απόδοση σε σύγκριση με τα ανταγωνιστικά μοντέλα βάσης που περιλαμβάνουν επίσης γραμμές βάσης πολλαπλών εργασιών. Παρουσιάζουμε επίσης αξιολογήσεις μηδενικού πυροβολισμού σε αόρατες γλώσσες στόχου για να καταδείξουμε τη χρησιμότητα του προτεινόμενου μοντέλου μας.', 'hu': 'A természetes nyelvi feldolgozási (NLP) feladatok (pl. angol nyelvű kérdésválasz) más feladatok (pl. angol nyelvű elnevezésű entitás felismerése) és más nyelvek (pl. spanyol nyelvű kérdésválasz) ismeretéből származnak. Az ilyen megosztott reprezentációkat általában elszigetelten tanulják, akár feladatok között, akár nyelvek között. Ebben a munkában metatanulási megközelítést javasolunk a feladatok és a nyelvek közötti interakciók tanulására. Vizsgáljuk továbbá a metatanulás során alkalmazott különböző mintavételi stratégiák szerepét. Az XTREME többnyelvű benchmark adatkészletéből öt különböző feladaton és hat különböző nyelven végzett kísérleteket mutatunk be. Meta-tanult modellünk egyértelműen javul a teljesítmény szempontjából a versenyképes alapvető modellekhez képest, amelyek többfeladatos alapvető értékeket is tartalmaznak. Bemutatjuk a láthatatlan célnyelvekre vonatkozó zéró értékeléseket is, hogy bemutassuk a javasolt modell hasznosságát.', 'ka': 'თავისუფალური ენის პროცესი (NLP) დავალებები (მაგალითად კითხვა-პასუხი ინგლისურად) სხვა დავალების ცნობიდან გამოიყენება (მაგალითად, სხვა ენების უცნობიდან ინგლისურად) და სხვა ენების ცნობიდან (მა ასეთი საზოგადოებული გამოსახულებები ტიპოლურად იზოლაციაში სწავლიანია, ან რაოდენობების განმავლობაში ან ენების განმავლობაში. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ მეტა-სწავლების მონაწილეობის მიზეზით, რომ სამუშაო და ენების შორის ინტერფექციას ვისწავლოთ. ჩვენ ასევე განსხვავებული სტრატიგიების პროლის გამოყენება მეტა-სწავლების დროში. ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტები ხუთი განსხვავებული საქაღალდე და ქვსი განსხვავებული ენები XTREME multilingual benchmark dataset-ზე. ჩვენი მეტა-სწავლილი მოდელი წარმოდგენად უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო მრავალური ჩვენ ასევე აჩვენებთ ნულ სტატის განსაზღვრებების უცნობილი მინიშვნელოვანი ენაზე, რომ გამოჩვენებთ ჩვენი მოდელის სუტილიტება.', 'it': "I compiti di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale (PNL) (ad esempio, rispondere alle domande in inglese) beneficiano della conoscenza di altri compiti (ad esempio, riconoscimento delle entità denominate in inglese) e della conoscenza di altre lingue (ad esempio, rispondere alle domande in spagnolo). Tali rappresentazioni condivise sono tipicamente apprese in modo isolato, sia attraverso attività che attraverso lingue. In questo lavoro, proponiamo un approccio di meta-apprendimento per imparare le interazioni tra compiti e lingue. Esaminiamo anche il ruolo delle diverse strategie di campionamento utilizzate durante il meta-apprendimento. Presentiamo esperimenti su cinque diversi compiti e sei lingue diverse dal set di dati di benchmark multilingue XTREME. Il nostro modello meta-learned migliora chiaramente le prestazioni rispetto ai modelli di base competitivi che includono anche linee di base multi-task. Presentiamo anche valutazioni zero-shot su lingue target invisibili per dimostrare l'utilità del nostro modello proposto.", 'ms': 'Tugas pemprosesan bahasa semulajadi (NLP) (cth. jawapan soalan dalam bahasa Inggeris) berguna dari pengetahuan tugas lain (cth., pengetahuan entiti bernama dalam bahasa Inggeris) dan pengetahuan bahasa lain (cth., jawapan soalan dalam bahasa Sepanyol). Perwakilan berkongsi seperti ini biasanya belajar dalam pengasingan, sama ada melalui tugas atau melalui bahasa. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan pendekatan meta-belajar untuk belajar interaksi antara kedua-dua tugas dan bahasa. Kami juga menyelidiki peran strategi pengumpulan yang berbeza yang digunakan semasa belajar meta. Kami memperkenalkan eksperimen pada lima tugas berbeza dan enam bahasa berbeza dari set data benchmark berbilang bahasa XTREME. Model meta-belajar kami jelas meningkat prestasi dibandingkan dengan model asas kompetitif yang juga termasuk garis asas multi-tugas. Kami juga memperkenalkan penilaian 0-shot pada bahasa sasaran yang tidak terlihat untuk menunjukkan utiliti modelnya.', 'mk': 'Природното преработување на јазикот (НЛП) задачите (на пример одговорите на прашања на англиски) имаат корист од знаењето на другите задачи (на пример, препознавањето на именуваниот ентитет на англиски) и знаењето на другите јазици (на пример одговорите на прашања на шпански). Таквите заеднички претставувања обично се научуваат во изолација, или преку задачи или преку јазици. Во оваа работа, предложуваме метаучење пристап за учење на интеракциите помеѓу задачите и јазиците. Исто така ја истражуваме улогата на различните стратегии за примерок кои се користат за време на метаучењето. We present experiments on five different tasks and six different languages from the XTREME multilingual benchmark dataset.  Нашиот мета-научен модел јасно се подобрува во перформансата во споредба со конкурентните основни модели кои вклучуваат и мултизадачни основни линии. Ние, исто така, претставуваме нуларни проценки на невидени јазици на цел за да ја демонстрираме корисноста на нашиот предложен модел.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയയുടെ (NLP) ജോലികള്\u200d (ഉദാഹരണമായി ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം ചോദ്യം) മറ്റു ജോലികളുടെ അറിവില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉപകരിക്കുന്നു (ഉദാഹരണമായ ഈ പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്ന പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d സാധാരണയായി ഒറ്റയ്ക്കായി പഠിക്കുന്നു, ജോലികളില്\u200d അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ഭ ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, ജോലികള്\u200dക്കും ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന് മെറ്റാ പഠിക്കുന്ന മെറ്റ-പഠനം പഠിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വ്യത്യസ്ത ഉപകരണങ്ങളുടെ പങ്ക് ഞങ്ങളും അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. എക്സ്ട്രെമെയില്\u200d നിന്നും അഞ്ചു വ്യത്യസ്ത ജോലികളിലും ആറു വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകളിലും നാം പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്ന Our meta-learned model clearly improves in performance compared to competitive baseline models that also include multi-task baselines.  നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലിന്റെ ഉപയോഗം കാണിക്കുന്നതിനായി അദൃശ്യമായ ലക്ഷ്യ ഭാഷകളില്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമാ', 'mt': 'Il-kompiti tal-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali (NLP) (pereżempju t-tweġiba g ħall-mistoqsijiet bl-Ingliż) jibbenefikaw mill-għarfien ta’ kompiti oħra (pereżempju r-rikonoxximent tal-entità msejħa bl-Ingliż) u l-għarfien ta’ lingwi oħra (pereżempju t-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet bl-Ispanjol). Dawn ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet kondiviżi tipikament jitgħallmu b’mod iżolat, jew bejn il-kompiti jew bejn il-lingwi. F’dan ix-xogħol, nipproponu approċċ meta-tagħlim biex nitgħallmu l-interazzjonijiet kemm bejn il-kompiti kif ukoll bejn il-lingwi. Aħna ninvestigaw ukoll ir-rwol ta’ strateġiji differenti ta’ teħid ta’ kampjuni użati matul it-tagħlim meta mqabbel ma’ dan. Aħna nippreżentaw esperimenti fuq ħames kompiti differenti u sitt lingwi differenti mis-sett ta’ dejta ta’ referenza multilingwi XTREME. Il-mudell tagħna meta-mgħallem itejjeb b’mod ċar il-prestazzjoni meta mqabbel ma’ mudelli ta’ bażi kompetittivi li jinkludu wkoll linji ta’ bażi multikompiti. Aħna nippreżentaw ukoll evalwazzjonijiet mingħajr skop fuq lingwi fil-mira li ma jidhrux biex juru l-utilità tal-mudell propost tagħna.', 'lt': 'Gamtinės kalbos apdorojimo (NLP) užduotys (pvz., atsakymas į klausimus anglų kalba) gauna naudos iš kitų užduočių žinių (pvz., pavadintas subjekto pripažinimas anglų kalba) ir kitų kalbų žinių (pvz., atsakymas į klausimus ispanų kalba). Toks bendras atstovavimas paprastai mokomas atskirai, atliekant užduotis arba kalbas. In this work, we propose a meta-learning approach to learn the interactions between both tasks and languages.  Taip pat tiriame įvairių mėginių ėmimo strategijų, naudojamų metamokymosi metu, vaidmenį. Pateikiame eksperimentus dėl penkių skirtingų užduočių ir šešių skirtingų kalbų nuo XTREME daugiakalbių lyginamųjų duomenų rinkinio. Mūsų metaišmoktas modelis akivaizdžiai gerina našumą, palyginti su konkurenciniais pagrindiniais modeliais, kurie taip pat apima daugelį užduočių. Mes taip pat pateikiame nenumatytų tikslinių kalbų vertinimus, kad būtų įrodyta mūsų siūlomo modelio nauda.', 'kk': 'Табиғи тілді өңдеу тапсырмалары (NLP) басқа тапсырмаларды (мысалы, сұрақ жауап беру ағылшын тілде) білім береді (мысалы, басқа тілдерді (мысалы, сұрақ жауап беру) және басқа тілдерді білім береді. Бұл ортақтастырылған тапсырмалар әдетте бұл тапсырмаларда немесе тілдерде үйреніледі. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, тапсырмалар мен тілдер арасындағы әріптерді оқыту үшін мета оқыту тәсілігін ұсынамыз. Мета оқыту үшін қолданылатын әртүрлі баптау стратегияларының рөлін зерттеп отырмыз. Біз бес түрлі тапсырмалар мен алты түрлі тілдерді XTREME көптілік белгілі белгілі белгілердің деректер қорларынан көрсетедік. Мета-үйренген үлгіміз көп тапсырма негізгі жолдарына салыстыратын бағдарламалар үлгілеріне салыстырылады. Біз сондай-ақ таңдалмаған тілдер үлгісін көрсету үшін нөл шарт бағалауын көрсетедік.', 'pl': 'Zadania dotyczące przetwarzania języka naturalnego (NLP) (np. odpowiedzi na pytania w języku angielskim) korzystają z znajomości innych zadań (np. rozpoznawania nazwy w języku angielskim) oraz znajomości innych języków (np. odpowiedzi na pytania w języku hiszpańskim). Takie współdzielone reprezentacje są zwykle uczone w izolacji, w różnych zadaniach lub w różnych językach. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy meta-learning podejście do nauki interakcji między zadaniami i językami. Badamy również rolę różnych strategii próbkowania stosowanych podczas meta-learningu. Przedstawiamy eksperymenty z pięciu różnych zadań i sześciu różnych języków z wielojęzycznego zestawu danych referencyjnego XTREME. Nasz meta-uczony model wyraźnie poprawia wydajność w porównaniu z konkurencyjnymi modelami bazowymi, które obejmują również wielozadaniowe linie bazowe. Przedstawiamy również zero-shot oceny niewidocznych języków docelowych, aby wykazać użyteczność proponowanego modelu.', 'no': 'Naturlige språkprocessingar (NLP) oppgåver (f.eks. spørsmål-svar på engelsk) er nyttig frå kunnskap av andre oppgåver (f.eks. oppgåver med namnet entitetskjenning på engelsk) og kunnskap av andre språk (f.eks. spørsmål-svar på spansk). Desse delte representasjonane er vanlegvis lærte i isolating, enten over oppgåver eller over språk. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi ein metalæringstilnærming til å lære interaksjonen mellom både oppgåver og språk. Vi undersøker også rolen på ulike samlingsstrategiar brukt under metalæring. Vi presenterer eksperimenter på fem forskjellige oppgåver og seks forskjellige språk frå XTREME-datasettet for fleire språk. Dette metalærte modellet er klart forbetra i utviklinga sammenlignet med konkurentære baseline-modeller som også inkluderer fleire oppgåver baseline. Vi presenterer også nullsattevalueringar på ukjende målspråk for å visa verktøyet til vår foreslått modell.', 'ro': 'Sarcinile de prelucrare a limbilor naturale (PNL) (de exemplu, răspunsul la întrebări în limba engleză) beneficiază de cunoașterea altor sarcini (de exemplu, recunoașterea entităților denumite în limba engleză) și cunoașterea altor limbi (de exemplu, răspunsul la întrebări în limba spaniolă). Astfel de reprezentări partajate sunt de obicei învățate în mod izolat, fie în cadrul activităților, fie în diferite limbi. În această lucrare, propunem o abordare meta-învățare pentru a învăța interacțiunile dintre sarcini și limbi. De asemenea, investigăm rolul diferitelor strategii de eșantionare utilizate în timpul meta-învățării. Vă prezentăm experimente pe cinci sarcini diferite și șase limbi diferite din setul de date de referință multilingv XTREME. Modelul nostru meta-învățat îmbunătățește în mod clar performanța în comparație cu modelele de bază competitive, care includ, de asemenea, linii de bază multi-task. De asemenea, prezentăm evaluări zero-shot privind limbile țintă nevăzute pentru a demonstra utilitatea modelului propus.', 'sr': 'Prirodno obrađivanje jezika (NLP) zadataka (npr. odgovor na pitanje na engleskom jeziku) koriste od znanja drugih zadataka (npr. priznanja entiteta na engleskom jeziku) i znanja drugih jezika (npr. odgovor na pitanje na španjolskom jeziku). Takve zajedničke predstave se obično uče u izolaciji, ili preko zadataka ili preko jezika. U ovom poslu predlažemo metanaučni pristup da naučimo interakciju između zadataka i jezika. Istražujemo i ulogu različitih strategija za uzorak uzorka korištenih tokom metaučenja. Predstavljamo eksperimente na pet različitih zadataka i šest različitih jezika iz kompleta multijezičkih standardnih podataka XTREME. Naš metanaučeni model jasno se poboljšava u usporedbi sa konkurentnim osnovnim modelima koji uključuju i početne linije multizadataka. Takoðe predstavljamo procjenu nule pucnjave na nevidljivim ciljnim jezicima kako bi pokazali korisnost našeg predloženog modela.', 'so': "Shaqooyinka ka baaraandegista afka asalka ah (NLP) waxey faa’iido ka helayaan aqoonta shaqaalaha kale (tusaale ahaan aqoonsiga entity afka Ingiriiska) iyo aqoonta luuqadaha kale (tusaale ahaan jawaabta su'aalaha Isbanish). Dhaqaalahaas wadajirka ah sida caadiga ah waxaa lagu baraa gooni ahaan, shaqooyin ama luuqado kala duwan. Markaas waxan waxaynu horumarinaynaa qaab waxbarasho oo meta ah si aan u barno xiriirka ka dhexeeya shaqada iyo luuqadaha. Sidoo kale waxaynu baaraynaa qaybaha qoraalka tusaalooyinka kala duduwan ee lagu isticmaalay marka lagu barto meta-barashada. Shan shaqooyin oo kala duduwan iyo lix luuqadood oo kala duduwan ayaannu sameynaa imtixaan ka soo bandhigaynaa xafiiska baabuurta luuqadaha kala duduwan ee XTREME. Tusaale-barashada metaalka ayaa si cad u korodhsan tababarka, barbarta noocyada tartanka ah, kuwaas oo sidoo kale ku jira saldhigyo shaqo badan. Sidoo kale waxaynu soo bandhignaa qiimeynta nooca ah oo ku qoran luuqadaha qarsoon ee la jeedo si aan u muujinno isticmaalka qaababka lagu talo galay.", 'sv': 'Naturliga språkbehandlingsuppgifter (t.ex. frågesvar på engelska) drar nytta av kunskaper i andra uppgifter (t.ex. namngiven entitetsigenkänning på engelska) och kunskaper i andra språk (t.ex. frågesvar på spanska). Sådana delade representationer lär sig vanligtvis separat, antingen över uppgifter eller över språk. I detta arbete föreslår vi ett meta-lärande tillvägagångssätt för att lära sig samspelet mellan både uppgifter och språk. Vi undersöker också rollen av olika samplingsstrategier som används vid metainlärning. Vi presenterar experiment på fem olika uppgifter och sex olika språk från XTREME flerspråkiga benchmarkdata. Vår meta-lärda modell förbättrar tydligt prestanda jämfört med konkurrenskraftiga basmodeller som också inkluderar multi-task baselines. Vi presenterar också noll-skott utvärderingar av osynliga målspråk för att visa nyttan av vår föreslagna modell.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл процесс (NLP) үйл ажиллагаа (жишээ нь асуулт хариулт Англи хэлний хэлний хариулт) бусад үйл ажиллагаа (жишээ нь, англи хэлний хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдсөн нэг зүйл) болон бусад хэлний мэдлэг (жишээ нь асуулт хариулт Испа Ийм хуваалтын үзүүлэлтийг ихэвчлэн ганцаараа, ажил эсвэл хэл дээр суралцдаг. Энэ ажлын тулд бид ажил болон хэл хоёр хоорондын харилцааны харилцааны талаар мета суралцах арга зам суралцдаг. Бид мөн мета суралцах үед хэрэглэгдсэн өөр өөр хэлбэрийн шинжлэх стратегийг судалж байна. Бид XTREME олон хэлний багц өгөгдлийн сангийн таван өөр ажил, зургаан өөр хэл дээр туршилтыг үзүүлнэ. Бидний мета суралцсан загвар дасгал хөдөлгөөнийг олон дасгал суурь шугам болон өрсөлдөг суурь шугам загвартай харьцуулахад тодорхой сайжруулдаг. Мөн бид өөрсдийн санал өгсөн загварын хэрэглээ илэрхийлж чадахгүй зорилготой хэлний талаар 0-шууд шалгалтыг илэрхийлж байна.', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாடு (NLP) பணிகள் (எ. ம். ஆங்கிலத்தில் கேள்வி பதில்) மற்ற பணிகளுக்கு அறிவிப்பு (உதாரணமாக, பொருள் ஆங்கிலத்தில் பெயர் அடையாளம்) மற்ற மொழிகளின் அற இத்தகைய பகிர்ந்த குறிப்புகள் வழக்கமாக தனியாக கற்றுக் கொள்ளப்படுகின்றன, அல்லது வேலைகளில் அல்லது மொழி இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு மெடா கற்றுக்கொள்ள முறையை முன்நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம் பணிகள் மற்றும் மொழிகளுக்கிடை மெடா கற்றல் போது பயன்படுத்தப்படும் வேறு மாதிரி திட்டங்களின் பங்கை நாம் ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம். XTREME பல மொழி பெங்க்மேக் தகவல் அமைப்பில் இருந்து ஐந்து வித்திய செயல்கள் மற்றும் ஆறு வித்தியாசமான மொழிகள் மீ பல பணி அடிப்படைக்கோடு மறைக்கப்படாத இலக்கு மொழிகளின் பயன்பாட்டை காட்டுவதற்காக பூஜ்ஜியமான சுட்டு மதிப்புகளை கொண்டுள்ளோம்.', 'ur': 'طبیعی زبان پردازی (NLP) کام (جیسے سوال جواب انگلیسی) اور دوسری زبانوں کا علم (جیسے سوال جواب) سے فائدہ اٹھاتے ہیں۔ اس طرح مشترک نمونات معمولاً تکلیف میں سکھائی جاتی ہیں، یا کاموں میں یا زبانوں میں. ہم اس کام میں ایک مٹا-سیکھنے کی طرح پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں تابع اور زبانوں کے درمیان تعامل کی تعامل سکھانے کے لئے۔ ہم نے مٹا سکونت میں استعمال کیا ہوا مختلف نمونوں کی استراتژی کا رول بھی تحقیق کیا ہے۔ ہم پانچ مختلف کاموں اور چھ مختلف زبانوں کو XTREME multilingual benchmark dataset سے آزمائش پیش کرتے ہیں. ہماری مٹا-سیکھی موڈل صریح طریقہ سے کامیابی کے مطابق مسابقات بنسلین موڈل کے ساتھ بہتر ہوتا ہے جو بہت سے کامیابی بنسلین بھی شامل ہوتے ہیں۔ ہم نے بھی نشانیوں کی زبانوں پر صفر-شٹ کا ارزش پیش کیا ہے کہ ہمارے پیش کیا ہوا موڈل کا فائدہ دکھائیں۔', 'si': 'ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපනය (NLP) ක්\u200dරියාපනය (ඉංග්\u200dරීසියේ ප්\u200dරශ්න-ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාපනය) අනිත් ක්\u200dරියාපනය (ඉංග්\u200dරීසියේ නම් කරුණ ඒ වගේ සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම ඉගෙනගන්නවා වැඩක් හෝ භාෂාවක් වලින්. මේ වැඩේ අපි මෙටා ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන්. අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා වෙනස් සැම්පල් විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ මෙටා ඉගෙන ගන්න විදියට. අපි වෙනස් වෙනස් වැඩක් පහයි වගේ භාෂාවය 6යි XTREME ගොඩක් භාෂාවික බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට් වල පරීක් අපේ මෙටා ඉගෙන ගත්ත මොඩල් පැහැදිලි විශේෂයෙන් වැඩි වෙනවා ප්\u200dරභාවයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  අපි ඉලක්ක භාෂාවන් නොදන්නේ නැති භාෂාවන් ශූර්ණ විශ්ලේෂණයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් අපේ ප්\u200dර', 'uz': "Natalik tillar boshqa vazifalar haqida (masalan ingliz tilida savol javob berish) va boshqa ish vazifalar haqida maʼlumot yordamida foydalanadi (masalan, ingliz tilida taʼrifi va boshqa tillar haqida maʼlumot (m. g. Ispanchada savol javob beradi). Bu ko'plab boʻlgan tashkilotlar ko'proq vazifalar yoki tillarda o'rganadi. Bu ishda, biz vazifalar va tillar orasidagi aloqalarni o'rganish uchun meta o'rganish usulini talab qilamiz. Biz meta-ta'limni o'rganishda boshqa misol strategiyaning rolini o'rganimiz. Biz besh boshqa vazifalar va XTREME bir necha tillar benchmark maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi 6 xil tillariga tajriba qilamiz. Our meta-learned model clearly improves in performance compared to competitive baseline models that also include multi-task baselines.  Biz o'zimiz ilhom modelimizning foydalanishini koʻrsatish uchun hech narsa qiymatni ko'rsamiz.", 'vi': 'Công việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (chọc ngoáy ngôn ngữ) (ví dụ như câu hỏi trả lời bằng tiếng Anh) có lợi dụng kiến thức về các công việc khác (ví dụ như nhận diện thực thể tên tiếng Anh) và kiến thức về các ngôn ngữ khác (ví dụ, câu hỏi-đáp-hỏi bằng tiếng Tây Ban Nha). Các biểu tượng chia sẻ như thế thường được học cách biệt, cả về các công việc hoặc các ngôn ngữ khác. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp chuyển giao tiếp giữa các công việc và ngôn ngữ. Chúng tôi cũng điều tra vai trò của các chiến lược lấy mẫu khác nhau trong quá trình meta-Learning. Chúng tôi cung cấp thí nghiệm với năm công việc khác nhau và sáu ngôn ngữ khác nhau từ bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn XTREME. Các mô hình meta-learn rõ ràng cải thiện lợi nhuận so với các mô hình cơ bản cạnh tranh mà cũng chứa các cơ sở đa công. Chúng tôi cũng đưa ra đánh giá không phát vào ngôn ngữ không nhìn thấy để chứng minh tiện ích của mô hình đã đề nghị.', 'bg': 'Задачите по обработка на естествения език (напр. отговаряне на въпроси на английски език) се възползват от познанията по други задачи (напр. признаване на наименовани субекти на английски език) и познанията по други езици (напр. отговаряне на въпроси на испански). Такива споделени представи обикновено се научават изолирано, или между задачи, или между езици. В тази работа предлагаме мета-учен подход за изучаване на взаимодействията между задачите и езиците. Проучваме и ролята на различните стратегии за вземане на проби, използвани по време на мета-обучение. Представяме експерименти по пет различни задачи и шест различни езика от многоезичния сравнителен набор от данни. Нашият мета-научен модел ясно се подобрява в производителността в сравнение с конкурентните базови модели, които включват и базови линии с много задачи. Също така представяме оценки с нулев изстрел на невидими целеви езици, за да демонстрираме полезността на нашия предложен модел.', 'nl': 'Natural language processing (NLP) taken (bijvoorbeeld vragen beantwoorden in het Engels) profiteren van kennis van andere taken (bijvoorbeeld naamsbekendheid in het Engels) en kennis van andere talen (bijvoorbeeld vragen beantwoorden in het Spaans). Dergelijke gedeelde representaties worden meestal afzonderlijk geleerd, hetzij in taken of in talen. In dit werk stellen we een meta-learning aanpak voor om de interacties tussen taken en talen te leren. We onderzoeken ook de rol van verschillende sampling strategieën die worden gebruikt tijdens meta-learning. We presenteren experimenten op vijf verschillende taken en zes verschillende talen uit de XTREME meertalige benchmark dataset. Ons meta-learning model verbetert duidelijk in prestaties in vergelijking met concurrerende baseline modellen die ook multi-task baselines bevatten. We presenteren ook zero-shot evaluaties op onzichtbare doeltalen om het nut van ons voorgestelde model aan te tonen.', 'de': 'Natural Language Processing (NLP)-Aufgaben (z.B. Fragebeantwortung in Englisch) profitieren von Kenntnissen anderer Aufgaben (z.B. Namenserkennung in Englisch) und Kenntnissen anderer Sprachen (z.B. Fragebeantwortung in Spanisch). Solche gemeinsamen Darstellungen werden normalerweise isoliert erlernt, entweder über Aufgaben oder über Sprachen hinweg. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir einen Meta-Learning Ansatz vor, um die Interaktionen zwischen Aufgaben und Sprachen zu lernen. Wir untersuchen auch die Rolle verschiedener Sampling-Strategien, die beim Meta-Learning verwendet werden. Wir präsentieren Experimente zu fünf verschiedenen Aufgaben und sechs verschiedenen Sprachen aus dem mehrsprachigen XTREME Benchmark Dataset. Unser Meta-Learning-Modell verbessert sich deutlich in der Leistung im Vergleich zu wettbewerbsfähigen Basismodellen, die auch Multi-Task-Baselines enthalten. Wir präsentieren auch Zero-Shot-Auswertungen für unsichtbare Zielsprachen, um den Nutzen unseres vorgeschlagenen Modells zu demonstrieren.', 'da': 'Opgaver til behandling af natursprog (NLP) (f.eks. spørgsmål besvarelse på engelsk) drager fordel af kendskab til andre opgaver (f.eks. navngivet enhedsgenkendelse på engelsk) og kendskab til andre sprog (f.eks. spørgsmål besvarelse på spansk). Sådanne delte repræsentationer læres typisk isoleret, enten på tværs af opgaver eller på tværs af sprog. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en meta-læringstilgang til at lære samspillet mellem både opgaver og sprog. Vi undersøger også rollen af forskellige samplingsstrategier, der anvendes under meta-læring. Vi præsenterer eksperimenter på fem forskellige opgaver og seks forskellige sprog fra XTREME flersprogede benchmark datasæt. Vores meta-lærte model forbedrer tydeligt ydeevnen sammenlignet med konkurrencedygtige basismodeller, der også omfatter multi-task baselines. Vi præsenterer også nul-shot evalueringer af usynlige målsprog for at demonstrere nytten af vores foreslåede model.', 'hr': 'Prirodno obrađivanje jezika (NLP) zadataka (npr. odgovor na pitanje na engleskom jeziku) koriste od znanja drugih zadataka (npr. priznanja entiteta na engleskom jeziku) i znanja drugih jezika (npr. odgovor na pitanje na španjolskom jeziku). Takve zajedničke predstave se obično uče u izolaciji, ili preko zadataka ili preko jezika. U ovom poslu predlažemo metanaučni pristup naučiti interakcije između zadataka i jezika. Istražujemo i ulogu različitih strategija za uzorak uzorka korištenih tijekom metaučenja. Predstavljamo eksperimente na pet različitih zadataka i šest različitih jezika iz multijezičkih standardnih podataka XTREME-a. Naš metanaučeni model jasno se poboljšava u usporedbi s konkurentnim početnim modelima koji uključuju i početne linije multizadataka. Također predstavljamo procjene od nule pucnjave na nevidljivim ciljnim jezicima kako bi pokazali korisnost našeg predloženog modela.', 'fa': 'وظیفه\u200cهای پرداخت زبان طبیعی (NLP) از دانش کارهای دیگر سود می\u200cدهد (به عنوان شناختن یک entity در انگلیسی) و دانش زبان دیگر (به عنوان جواب سوال در اسپانیایی). این نمایش\u200cهای مشترک معمولا در تنهایی یاد می\u200cگیرند، یا در سراسر وظیفه\u200cها یا در سراسر زبانها. در این کار، ما یک روش یادگیری متا را پیشنهاد می کنیم تا تعامل بین وظیفه ها و زبانها یاد بگیریم. ما همچنین نقش استراتژی\u200cهای نمونه\u200cهای مختلف را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که در زمان یادگیری متا استفاده می\u200cشود. ما آزمایش\u200cها را روی پنج کار متفاوت و شش زبان متفاوت از مجموعه داده\u200cهای صندوق زیادی زبان XTREME نشان می\u200cدهیم. مدل متا یاد گرفته شده ما به طور واضح در عملکرد در مقایسه با مدل\u200cهای پایین مسابقه\u200cای که همچنین شامل خط\u200cهای پایین\u200cهای زیادی\u200cکار است بهتر می\u200cشود. ما همچنین ارزیابی صفر را در زبانهای هدف ناشناخته برای نشان دادن استفاده از مدل پیشنهاد ما نشان می دهیم.', 'id': 'Tugas proses bahasa alami (NLP) (contohnya menjawab pertanyaan dalam bahasa Inggris) berguna dari pengetahuan tugas lain (contohnya pengetahuan entitas bernama dalam bahasa Inggris) dan pengetahuan bahasa lain (contohnya menjawab pertanyaan dalam bahasa Spanyol). Perwakilan berbagi seperti ini biasanya belajar dalam isolasi, baik melalui tugas atau melalui bahasa. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan pendekatan meta-belajar untuk belajar interaksi antara kedua tugas dan bahasa. Kami juga menyelidiki peran strategi sampel yang berbeda yang digunakan selama belajar meta. Kami mempersembahkan eksperimen pada lima tugas yang berbeda dan enam bahasa yang berbeda dari set data benchmark multibahasa XTREME. Model meta-belajar kami jelas meningkat prestasi dibandingkan dengan model dasar kompetitif yang juga termasuk garis dasar multi-tugas. Kami juga mempersembahkan evaluasi zero-shot pada bahasa sasaran yang tidak terlihat untuk menunjukkan utilitas modelnya.', 'sw': 'Kazi za utaratibu wa lugha za asili (NLP) zinafaa kwa ufahamu wa kazi nyingine (kama vile utambulisho wa entity kwa Kiingereza) na maarifa ya lugha nyingine (kwa mfano, jibu la maswali kwa Kihispania). Wawakilishaji wa aina hiyo hujifunza kwa kawaida katika kutengana, au katika kazi au katika lugha mbalimbali. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza mbinu ya kujifunza kwa njia ya meta ili kujifunza mahusiano kati ya kazi na lugha hizo. Pia tunachunguza jukumu la mipango tofauti ya sampuli iliyotumika wakati wa kujifunza kwa meta. Tunaonyesha majaribio kuhusu kazi tano tofauti na lugha sita tofauti kutoka kwenye seti ya taarifa za lugha mbalimbali za XTREME. Mfano wetu wa mafunzo unaofahamika vizuri katika utendaji ukilinganisha na mifano ya msingi wa ushindani ambao pia inajumuisha misingi ya kazi mbalimbali. We also present zero-shot evaluations on unseen target languages to demonstrate the utility of our proposed model.', 'af': "Natuurlike taal verwerking (NLP) opdragte (bv. vraag-antwoord in Engels) voordeel van kennis van ander opdragte (bv. genoem entiteiterkenning in Engels) en kennis van ander tale (bv. vraag-antwoord in Spaanse). Soos gedeelde voorstellings word tipies in isolatie geleer, of oor opdragte of oor tale. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n meta-leer toegang om die interaksie tussen beide taak en taal te leer. Ons ondersoek ook die rol van verskillende samplingsstrategies wat gebruik word tydens meta-leer. Ons voorsien eksperimente op vyf verskillende taak en ses verskillende tale van die XTREME multilinguele benchmark datastel. Ons meta-leer model is duidelik verbeter in effektuur in vergelyking met medelyk basisline modele wat ook multi-taak basisline insluit. Ons stel ook nul-skoot evaluasies op onverskynlike doel tale om die nutsprogram van ons voorgestelde model te wys.", 'ko': '자연언어처리(NLP) 임무(예를 들어 영어 퀴즈)는 다른 임무(예를 들어 영어 명칭 실체 식별)와 다른 언어(예를 들어 스페인어 퀴즈)의 지식 덕분이다.이런 공유 표현법은 통상적으로 고립적으로 학습하는 것으로 임무를 뛰어넘어 학습할 수도 있고 언어를 뛰어넘어 학습할 수도 있다.이 업무에서 우리는 임무와 언어 간의 상호작용을 배우는 원 학습 방법을 제시했다.우리는 원 학습에서 사용하는 서로 다른 표본 추출 전략의 작용도 조사했다.XTREME 다중 언어 기준 데이터 세트의 다섯 가지 다른 작업과 여섯 가지 다른 언어를 실험했습니다.같은 다중 임무 기선을 포함하는 경쟁적 기선 모델에 비해 우리 원 학습 모델의 성능이 현저히 향상되었다.우리는 우리가 제시한 모델의 실용성을 증명하기 위해 보이지 않는 목표 언어에 대해 제로 평가를 실시했다.', 'sq': 'Detyrat e përpunimit natyror të gjuhës (NLP) (për shembull përgjigjen në pyetje në anglisht) përfitojnë nga njohuria e detyrave të tjera (për shembull njohje e emëruar njësi në anglisht) dhe njohuria e gjuhëve të tjera (për shembull përgjigjen në pyetje në spanjoll). Të tilla përfaqësime të përbashkëta mësohen tipikisht në izolim, ose nëpërmjet detyrave ose nëpërmjet gjuhëve. Në këtë punë, propozojmë një metodë meta-mësimi për të mësuar ndërveprimet midis detyrave dhe gjuhëve. We also investigate the role of different sampling strategies used during meta-learning.  Ne paraqesim eksperimente mbi pesë detyra të ndryshme dhe gjashtë gjuhë të ndryshme nga grupi i të dhënave të referencës shumëgjuhëse XTREME. Modeli ynë meta-mësuar përmirësohet qartë në performancë krahasuar me modelet konkurruese bazë që përfshijnë gjithashtu linjat bazë shumëdetyrash. Ne prezantojmë gjithashtu vlerësime zero-shot në gjuhët e padukshme objektive për të demonstruar dobinë e modelit tonë të propozuar.', 'az': 'T…ôbi…ôtli dil iŇül…ôm…ôsi (NLP) iŇül…ôri (m…ôs…ôl…ôn sual cavab verm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn) baŇüqa iŇül…ôrin bilgisind…ôn faydalanńĪr (m…ôs…ôl…ôn, dill…ôrin tanńĪnmasńĪ v…ô baŇüqa dill…ôrin bilgisind…ôn istifad…ô edir). B√ľt√ľn bu paylaŇüńĪlmńĪŇü g√∂st…ôricil…ôr genellikle yalnńĪz t…ôkrarlarda √∂yr…ônirl…ôr, ya da iŇül…ôrd…ô, ya da dill…ôrd…ô. Bu iŇüd…ô, h…ôr iŇüin v…ô dill…ôrin arasńĪndakńĪ miqdarńĪ √∂yr…ônm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn meta √∂yr…ônm…ô metodlarńĪnńĪ t…ôklif edirik. Biz d…ô meta √∂yr…ônm…ôsind…ô istifad…ô edil…ôn m√ľxt…ôlif n√ľmun…ôl…ôrin stratejil…ôrin rol√ľn√ľ incidirik. Biz beŇü f…ôrqli iŇül…ôr v…ô XTREME √ßoxlu dil benchmark veril…ôr qutusundan altńĪ f…ôrqli dil t…ôŇüviq edirik. Meta √∂yr…ôndiyimiz modell…ôrimiz m√ľharib…ô s…ôhif…ôl…ôri il…ô birlikd…ô √ßoxlu iŇüin s…ôhif…ôl…ôri d…ô dahil edil…ôn m√ľharib…ô s…ôhif…ôl…ôrind…ô daha yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrńĪr. Biz d…ô t…ôklif etdiyimiz modell…ôrin istifad…ôsini g√∂st…ôrm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn g√∂r√ľnm…ôdiyimiz m…ôqs…ôd dill…ôrind…ô sńĪfńĪr-f…ôsad deńüerlendirm…ôl…ôri g√∂st…ôririk.', 'hy': 'Բնական լեզվի վերամշակման (ՆԼՊ) խնդիրները (օրինակ, հարցերի պատասխանը անգլերենով) օգտագործվում են այլ խնդիրների գիտելիքից (օրինակ, անգլերենով կոչվող անհատականության ճանաչելը) և այլ լեզվի գիտելիքից (օրինակ, իսպաներեն հարցերի պատասխանը Այսպիսի ընդհանուր ներկայացումները սովորվում են առանձին ձևերով, կամ աշխատանքներում, կամ լեզուներում: In this work, we propose a meta-learning approach to learn the interactions between both tasks and languages.  We also investigate the role of different sampling strategies used during meta-learning.  Մենք ներկայացնում ենք փորձեր հինգ տարբեր խնդիրների և վեց տարբեր լեզուների վրա XTreme-ի բազմալեզու համեմատական տվյալների համակարգում: Մեր մետա-սովորված մոդելը ակնհայտորեն բարելավում է արդյունքը համեմատած մրցակցության հիմնական մոդելների հետ, որոնք ներառում են նաև բազմախնդիրների հիմնական գծեր: Մենք նաև ներկայացնում ենք զրոյական գնահատումներ անտեսանելի նպատակային լեզուների վրա, որպեսզի ապացուցենք մեր առաջարկված մոդելի օգտակարությունը:', 'tr': 'Natal dil işlemegi (NLP) zadalary (meselâ, sorag-jogap bermek) başga zadlaryň bilgisinden (meselâ, iňlis dilinde tanyş bir zat) we başga dilleriň bilimi (meselâ, sorag-jogap ispanyola). Bu ýaly bölünen suratlar adatça bir-birinden, ya işlerde, ya da dillerde öwrenip bilýärler. Bu işde, hem işler hem diller arasyndaky etkileşimleri öwrenmek üçin meta-öwrenmek metodasyny teklip edýäris. Biz hem meta öwrenmek wagtynda ulanylan örnek taýýarlama strategiýasynyň rolini barlaşdyrýarys. Biz beş dürli iş we alty dürli dillerde XTREME multi dilli benchmark verilerinden deneyleri çykýarys. Meta-öwrenmeli nusgamyz çykyşymyzda ýakynlaşyk çykyş baseline nusgalaryna görä gowylaşýar. Bu nusgalaryň hem birnäçe-täbli üýtgeşik hatlary bar. Biz hem biziň teklip eden nusganymyzyň faydalyny görkezmek üçin bilinmän maksady dillerde 0-at çykyşlaryny görkezip berýäris.', 'bs': 'Prirodno obrađivanje jezika (NLP) zadataka (npr. odgovor na pitanje na engleskom jeziku) koriste od znanja drugih zadataka (npr. priznanja entiteta na engleskom jeziku) i znanja drugih jezika (npr. odgovor na pitanje na španjolskom jeziku). Takve zajedničke predstave se obično uče u izolaciji, ili preko zadataka ili preko jezika. U ovom poslu predlažemo metanaučni pristup da naučimo interakcije između zadataka i jezika. Istražujemo i ulogu različitih strategija za uzorak uzorka korištenih tokom metaučenja. Predstavljamo eksperimente na pet različitih zadataka i šest različitih jezika iz kompleta multijezičkih kriterija XTREME. Naš metanaučeni model jasno se poboljšava u usporedbi s konkurentnim početnim modelima koji uključuju i početne linije multizadataka. Također predstavljamo procjene od nule pucnjave na nevidljivim ciljnim jezicima kako bi pokazali korisnost našeg predloženog modela.', 'ca': "Les tasques de processament de llenguatges naturals (NLP) (per exemple, respondre a preguntes en anglès) beneficien del coneixement d'altres tasques (per exemple, reconeixement d'entitats anomenades en anglès) i del coneixement d'altres llenguatges (per exemple, respondre a preguntes en espanyol). Aquestes representacions compartides s'aprenen típicament a l'aïllament, tant a través de tasques com a llengües. En aquesta feina, proposem un enfocament de meta-aprenentatge per aprendre les interaccions entre tasques i llengües. També investigam el paper de les diferents estratègies de recolliment de mostres utilitzades durant el meta-aprenentatge. Presentam experiments en cinc tasques diferents i sis llengües diferents del conjunt de dades multilingües de referència XTREME. El nostre model de meta-aprenentatge millora clarament en el rendiment comparat amb models de base competitius que també inclouen línies de base multitasca. També presentem evaluacions de zero sobre llengües d'objectiu invisibles per demostrar l'utilitat del nostre model proposat.", 'cs': 'Úkoly zpracování přirozeného jazyka (NLP) těží z znalosti dalších úkolů (např. rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit v angličtině) a znalosti dalších jazyků (např. odpovědi na otázky ve španělštině). Taková sdílená reprezentace se obvykle učí izolovaně, ať už napříč úkoly nebo napříč jazyky. V této práci navrhujeme meta-learningový přístup k naučení interakcí mezi úkoly a jazyky. Dále zkoumáme roli různých strategií vzorkování používaných při metaučení. Představujeme experimenty na pěti různých úkolech a šesti různých jazycích z vícejazyčného benchmarkového datového souboru XTREME. Náš meta-naučený model jasně zlepšuje výkon ve srovnání s konkurenčními základními modely, které také obsahují víceúlohové základní linie. Také prezentujeme nulové hodnocení neviditelných cílových jazyků, abychom demonstrovali užitečnost našeho navrhovaného modelu.', 'et': 'Loodusliku keele töötlemise (NLP) ülesanded (nt küsimustele vastamine inglise keeles) saavad kasu teadmistest muudest ülesannetest (nt nimetatud üksuse tunnustamine inglise keeles) ja teiste keelte oskustest (nt küsimustele vastamine hispaania keeles). Selliseid jagatud esitusi õpitakse tavaliselt eraldi, kas ülesannete või keelte vahel. Käesolevas töös pakume välja metaõppe lähenemisviisi, et õppida nii ülesannete kui ka keelte vahelisi interaktsioone. Samuti uurime metaõppe käigus kasutatavate erinevate valimisstrateegiate rolli. Esitleme eksperimente viie erineva ülesande ja kuue erineva keelega mitmekeelsest võrdlusandmekogumist XTREME. Meie metaõppitud mudel parandab selgelt jõudlust võrreldes konkurentsivõimeliste baasmudelitega, mis sisaldavad ka mitme ülesandega baasmudeleid. Samuti esitame null-shot hinnanguid nähtamatute sihtkeelte kohta, et näidata meie pakutud mudeli kasulikkust.', 'fi': 'Luonnonkielen käsittelyn (NLP) tehtävät (esim. kysymyksiin vastaaminen englanniksi) hyötyvät muiden tehtävien tuntemuksesta (esim. nimettyjen yhteisöjen tunnistaminen englanniksi) ja muiden kielten tuntemuksesta (esim. kysymyksiin vastaaminen espanjaksi). Tällaiset jaetut esitykset opetetaan yleensä erillään, joko tehtävien tai kielten välillä. Tässä työssä ehdotamme metaoppimista, jolla opitaan sekä tehtävien että kielten vuorovaikutusta. Tutkimme myös erilaisten metaoppimisen näytteenottostrategioiden roolia. Esitämme kokeiluja viidellä eri tehtävällä ja kuudella eri kielellä XTREME monikielisestä vertailuaineistosta. Meta-opittu mallimme parantaa suorituskykyä selvästi verrattuna kilpailukykyisiin perusmalleihin, jotka sisältävät myös monitehtäviä. Esitämme myös nollahaun arviointeja näkymättömistä kohdekielistä osoittaaksemme ehdotetun mallin hyödyllisyyden.', 'am': 'የአዳባዊ ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ (NLP) ስራዎችን (ምሳሌ በንግግሊዘኛ ጥያቄ መልስ) በሌላ ስራ ማወቅ ይጠቅማል (ምሳሌ አካባቢው በንግግሊዝኛ የሚታወቀው እና ሌሎችን ቋንቋዎች ማውቀት (ምሳሌ በስፓኒሽ ቋንቋ የሚመልስ ጥያቄ) እንደነዚህ የተካፈሉት መልዕክቶች በተለየ ሥራ ወይም በቋንቋ ቋንቋ ውስጥ ይማራሉ፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የስራ እና ቋንቋዎች መካከል ግንኙነትን ለመማር የመተማር ልውቀትን እናስጀራለን፡፡ በ ማተማር ውስጥ የሚጠቀሙትን የልዩ ምሳሌ strategie አካሄድን እናምርመራለን፡፡ ከአምስት ልዩ ስራዎችን እና ስድስት ልዩ ቋንቋዎች የተለያዩ የXTREME ብዙልቋ የbenchmark ዳርቻ ላይ ፈተናዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ማተማሩ ሞዴሌያችን በብዙ-ስራ መደገፊያዎች በሚያስተካክሉ ብሔራዊ መደገፊያ አካባቢ ሳጥን ትክክል ይሻላል፡፡ በተዘጋጀው የሞዴል ጥያቄን ለማሳየት በተሳወቁት ቋንቋዎች ላይ የ0 የፎቶ ድምፅ አቀረብን፡፡', 'bn': 'স্বাভাবিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়া (এনএলপি) কাজ (উদাহরণ ইংরেজী ভাষায় প্রশ্নের উত্তর) অন্যান্য কাজের জ্ঞান থেকে সুবিধা প্রদান করে (উদাহরণস্বরূপ ইংরেজীতে প্রতি এই ধরনের প্রতিনিধিত্ব সাধারণত বিচ্ছিন্ন ভাষায় শিক্ষা প্রদান করা হয়, কাজের বাইরে কিংবা ভাষায়। এই কাজে আমরা একটি মেটা শিক্ষা প্রস্তাব করছি যাতে কাজ ও ভাষার মধ্যে যুক্তি শিখতে পারি। এছাড়াও আমরা বিভিন্ন ধরনের উদাহরণ কৌশলের ভূমিকা তদন্ত করি। আমরা এক্স্ট্রেমের বহুভাষী বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেট থেকে পাঁচটি ভিন্ন কাজ এবং ছয়টি ভাষায় পরীক্ষা প্রদান করি। আমাদের মেটা-শিক্ষিত মডেল প্রতিযোগিতার মাধ্যমে প্রতিযোগিতা বেসাইন মডেলের তুলনায় পরিষ্কার প্রদর্শনের পরিবর্তে উন্নতি  আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেলের ব্যবহার প্রদর্শনের জন্য অদৃশ্য টার্গেট ভাষার উপর আমরা শুধুমাত্র গুলি মূল্য উপস্থাপন করি।', 'ha': "Natural language processing (NLP) tasks (e.g. question-answering in English) benefit from knowledge of other tasks (e.g., named entity recognition in English) and knowledge of other languages (e.g., question-answering in Spanish).  Wannan hotunan da aka raba su ana sanar da su a cikin wurãre ko cikin harshen dabam. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗa wata hanyoyi ta sanar da mutane dõmin ka san gakiya tsakanin aikin da harshen. Kayya, Munã karatun rolin misãlai daban da aka yi amfani da shi a lokacin da za'a sanar meta. Tuna gabatar da jarrabãwa kan aikin shan dabam-dabam da sakan harshe dabam-dabam daga data na XTREMEKCharselect unicode block name Misalinmu da aka sanar shi na bayyana mafarin aiki a sami da misãlai masu bastarwa da yin gaugãwa, da waɗannan akwai misalin aiki masu yawa. Kamar haka, Muke halatar da tunkuɗe-sifo kan harshen wanda ba'a ɓõye ba dõmin ya nuna amfani da misalinmu da aka buƙata.", 'sk': 'Naloge obdelave naravnega jezika (NLP) (npr. odgovarjanje na vprašanja v angleščini) koristijo od znanja drugih nalog (npr. priznavanje imenovanega subjekta v angleščini) in znanja drugih jezikov (npr. odgovarjanje na vprašanja v španščini). Takšne skupne predstavitve se običajno naučijo ločeno, bodisi med nalogami ali med jeziki. V tem delu predlagamo metaučni pristop za učenje interakcij med nalogami in jeziki. Preučujemo tudi vlogo različnih strategij vzorčenja, ki se uporabljajo med metaučenjem. Predstavljamo eksperimente na petih različnih nalogah in šestih različnih jezikih iz večjezičnega referenčnega nabora podatkov XTREME. Naš metaučen model jasno izboljšuje učinkovitost v primerjavi s konkurenčnimi osnovnimi modeli, ki vključujejo tudi večopravilne osnovne linije. Predstavljamo tudi ničelne ocene nevidnih ciljnih jezikov, da bi dokazali uporabnost našega predlaganega modela.', 'he': 'משימות עיבוד שפת טבעית (NLP) (למשל עניין על שאלות באנגלית) מקבלות תועלת מידע על משימות אחרות (למשל זיהוי ישות בשם באנגלית) וידע על שפות אחרות (למשל עניין על שאלות בספרדית). מייצגים משותפים כאלה נלמדים בדרך כלל בבידוד, בין משימות או בין שפות. In this work, we propose a meta-learning approach to learn the interactions between both tasks and languages.  אנחנו חוקרים גם את התפקיד של אסטרטגיות דוגמיות שונות שמשתמשות במהלך המטה-לימוד. We present experiments on five different tasks and six different languages from the XTREME multilingual benchmark dataset.  המודל המטה-למד שלנו משתפר בבירור ביצועים בהשוואה לדוגמנים תחרותיים שגם כוללים קווי בסיס multi-משימה. אנחנו גם מציגים ערכות אפס-יריות על שפות מטרה בלתי נראות כדי להוכיח את היעילות של המודל המוצע שלנו.', 'bo': 'རང་བཞིན་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་ལས་སྦྱོར་ཀྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་དང་། དཔེར་ན། སྐད་ཡིག་གཞན་ལས་ཤེས་དཔྱད་ན། དབྱེ་སྟངས་འདི་དག་ནི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་སོ་སོའི་ནང་དུ་ལས་ཀ་ཡིན་ན་སྐད་རིགས་ཤེས་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་རིམ་དང་སྐད་རིགས་གཉིས་དབར་གྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་མཐུན་སྣུམ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བཤད་པ་ལ། ང་ཚོས་meta-learning་ནང་དུ་སྤྱོད་པའི་དཔྱད་རིགས་དབྱེ་སྟངས་མི་འདྲ་བའི་བྱས་པར་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། XTREME multilingual benchmark dataset ཐོག་ལས་སྒེར་གྱི་ལས་ཚོལ་ལྡན་དང་། སྐད་རིགས་འདྲ་མིའི་ནང་གི་གྲངས་སུ་མཐུན་གྲངས་ཀ་དང་། ལྟ་བུའི་ནང ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་བྱུང་learned་གི་མ་གཟུགས་རིས་ལྟར་སྐྱེས་པའི་ཚད་གཞི་རྩལ་བ་དང་མཐོང་ནི་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་གཏོང་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་མི་ཤེས་པའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་ཉེན་རྟོན་པར་ལྡན་གྲངས་ཀ་གཅིག་པ་མཚུངས་ཡོད།', 'jv': 'Perusahaan langkung nggunakake Ayo cah-cah liyane Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné supoyo pergambar meta-Learn kanggo ngerasakno karo cara nggawe lan dilané. Awak dhéwé ngerasakno ngerasakno karo perkaraan samplit nang meta-ingkang. Awak dhéwé éntukno perintah sing sampeyan luwih akeh lan sesuk langgar sampeyan ing dataset XTREME multilanggar Kita meta-Learn model sing paling nggawe barang nggawe geraraning nggawe model sing bisa perusahaan banget, kuwi mau multi-task basic linen kuwi tambah. Awak dhéwé éntuk mulai perusahaan saiki nggawe tarjamahan kanggo nggambar aturan sing nyimpen nggawe modèl.'}
{'en': 'Two Training Strategies for Improving Relation Extraction over Universal Graph', 'pt': 'Duas estratégias de treinamento para melhorar a extração de relação sobre o gráfico universal', 'ar': 'استراتيجيتان تدريبيتان لتحسين استخراج العلاقة على الرسم البياني العالمي', 'fr': "Deux stratégies de formation pour améliorer l'extraction de relations par rapport au graphe universel", 'hi': 'यूनिवर्सल ग्राफ पर संबंध निष्कर्षण में सुधार के लिए दो प्रशिक्षण रणनीतियाँ', 'ja': 'ユニバーサルグラフ上の関係抽出を改善するための2つのトレーニング戦略', 'es': 'Dos estrategias de entrenamiento para mejorar la extracción de relaciones sobre el gráfico universal', 'ga': 'Dhá Straitéis Oiliúna chun Eastóscadh Gaol a Fheabhsú thar Ghraf Uilíoch', 'zh': '改进通用图取二教', 'ru': 'Две стратегии обучения для улучшения извлечения отношений по универсальному графику', 'hu': 'Két képzési stratégia a kapcsolat kivonásának javítására az univerzális grafikon felett', 'it': "Due strategie di formazione per migliorare l'estrazione delle relazioni rispetto al grafico universale", 'kk': 'Екі оқыту стратегиясы қатынас тарқату үшін Universal Graph арқылы', 'el': 'Δύο στρατηγικές κατάρτισης για τη βελτίωση της εξαγωγής σχέσεων σε παγκόσμιο γράφημα', 'ka': 'ორი სტრექტიკური სტრატიგია პროგრამის გამოსახულება საერთო გრაფიდან', 'lt': 'Dvi mokymo strategijos, skirtos santykių ekstrahavimui pagal visuotinį grafiką gerinti', 'mk': 'Две стратегии за обука за подобрување на екстракцијата на односите преку универзалниот граф', 'ml': 'യൂണിവല്\u200d ഗ്രാഫിന്റെ മുന്\u200dപിലുള്ള ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനായി രണ്ടു പരിശീലന സ്ട്രേറ്റേജിയുകള്\u200d', 'no': 'To treningsstrategier for å forbetra utpakking av relasjonar over universelt graf', 'mn': 'Хоёр дасгал хөгжүүлэх стратеги Универсал график дээр харилцааны нэмэгдүүлэлтийг сайжруулах', 'pl': 'Dwie strategie szkoleniowe dla poprawy ekstrakcji relacji na uniwersalnym wykresie', 'ro': 'Două strategii de formare pentru îmbunătățirea extracției relației peste graficul universal', 'mt': 'Żewġ Strateġiji ta’ Taħriġ għat-Titjib tal-Estrazzjoni tar-Relazzjonijiet fuq Graff Universali', 'ms': 'Dua Strategi Latihan untuk meningkatkan Ekstraksi Hubungan melalui Graf Universal', 'so': 'Two Training Strategies for improving Relations Extraction over Graph', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ ග්\u200dරාෆ් වලින් සම්බන්ධ විශේෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය දෙකක්', 'ta': 'பொதுவான வரைப்படத்திற்கு மேம்படுத்துவதற்கான இரண்டு பயிற்சி விவரங்கள்', 'ur': 'دو ٹرینینگ استراتٹریسی واسطے ارتباط اخراج کی عمدہ کرنا کے لئے یونیورل گراف پر', 'sr': 'Dvije strategije obuke za poboljšanje izvlačenja odnosa preko univerzalnog grafa', 'sv': 'Två utbildningsstrategier för att förbättra relationsextraktion över universell graf', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hai phương pháp huấn luyện nhằm nâng ly quan hệ chiết xuất trên đồ họa chung', 'bg': 'Две стратегии за обучение за подобряване на извличането на отношенията над универсалната графика', 'hr': 'Dvije strategije obuke za poboljšanje izvlačenja odnosa na univerzalnom grafiku', 'nl': 'Twee trainingsstrategieën voor het verbeteren van relatienextractie over universele grafiek', 'id': 'Two Training Strategies for Improving Relation Extraction over Universal Graph', 'ko': '범도 관계 추출을 개선하는 두 가지 훈련 전략', 'da': 'To træningsstrategier til forbedring af relationsudvinding over universel graf', 'de': 'Zwei Trainingsstrategien zur Verbesserung der Beziehungsextraktion über Universal Graph', 'tr': 'Ilşik Açmak üçin Iň Kop Taýramçylyk Strateji', 'af': 'Twee oefening strategies vir verbetering van verwante uittrekking oor Universele Graaf', 'sw': 'Mitizo miwili ya mafunzo kwa ajili ya kuboresha Kutengeneza Kuhusiana katika Graph ya Kimataifa', 'hy': 'Երկու հարաբերությունների վերացման բարելավման վերաբերյալ համաշխարհային գրաֆի վերաբերյալ ուսուցման ռազմավարություն', 'az': 'Universal Graph üzərində İlişkiləri Yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün İki Eğitim Strateji', 'sq': 'Dy strategji stërvitjeje për përmirësimin e ekstraksionit të marrëdhënieve lidhur me grafin universal', 'bn': 'বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের গ্রাফের বিভিন্ন সংযোগ বিদ্রুপের জন্য দুটি প্রশিক্ষণ কৌশল', 'bs': 'Dvije strategije obuke za poboljšanje izvlačenja odnosa na univerzalnom grafiku', 'am': 'በዩንቨርስቲው ግራፍ ላይ የሚያሳድግ ግንኙነት ማውጣት', 'ca': 'Two Training Strategies for Improving Relation Extraction over Universal Graph', 'cs': 'Dvě tréninkové strategie pro zlepšení extrakce vztahů přes univerzální graf', 'et': 'Kaks koolitusstrateegiat suhete ekstraheerimise parandamiseks üldise graafiku üle', 'fi': 'Kaksi koulutusstrategiaa, joilla parannetaan suhdetta yleismaailmalliseen graafiin verrattuna', 'fa': 'دو استراتژی آموزش برای بهترین استخراج ارتباط در گراف جهانی', 'sk': 'Dve strategiji usposabljanja za izboljšanje odnosov preko univerzalnega grafika', 'jv': 'Iso Rasané sing beraksi kanggo nggawe akeh luwih dumateng resmi kanggo Universal Graph', 'he': 'שתי אסטרטגיות אימונים לשיפור מחלקת יחסים על גרף Universal', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཕྱིར་བསྐྱེད་ཚད་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ཐབས་ལ་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་རེད།', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name'}
{'en': 'This paper explores how the Distantly Supervised Relation Extraction (DS-RE) can benefit from the use of a Universal Graph (UG), the combination of a Knowledge Graph (KG) and a large-scale text collection. A straightforward extension of a current state-of-the-art neural model for DS-RE with a UG may lead to degradation in performance. We first report that this degradation is associated with the difficulty in learning a UG and then propose two training strategies : (1) Path Type Adaptive Pretraining, which sequentially trains the model with different types of UG paths so as to prevent the reliance on a single type of UG path ; and (2) Complexity Ranking Guided Attention mechanism, which restricts the attention span according to the complexity of a UG path so as to force the model to extract features not only from simple UG paths but also from complex ones. Experimental results on both biomedical and NYT10 datasets prove the robustness of our methods and achieve a new state-of-the-art result on the NYT10 dataset. The code and datasets used in this paper are available at https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'ar': 'تستكشف هذه الورقة كيف يمكن أن يستفيد استخراج العلاقة الخاضع للإشراف عن بُعد (DS-RE) من استخدام الرسم البياني العالمي (UG) ، والجمع بين الرسم البياني المعرفي (KG) ومجموعة النصوص على نطاق واسع. قد يؤدي الامتداد المباشر لنموذج عصبي حديث حديث لـ DS-RE مع UG إلى تدهور الأداء. أبلغنا أولاً أن هذا التدهور مرتبط بصعوبة تعلم UG ثم نقترح استراتيجيتين للتدريب: (1) التدريب المسبق التكيفي لنوع المسار ، والذي يقوم بتدريب النموذج بشكل تسلسلي بأنواع مختلفة من مسارات UG وذلك لمنع الاعتماد على واحد نوع مسار UG ؛ و (2) آلية الانتباه الموجه لتصنيف التعقيد ، والتي تقيد مدى الانتباه وفقًا لتعقيد مسار UG لإجبار النموذج على استخراج الميزات ليس فقط من مسارات UG البسيطة ولكن أيضًا من المسارات المعقدة. تثبت النتائج التجريبية على كل من مجموعات البيانات الطبية الحيوية و NYT10 متانة أساليبنا وتحقق نتيجة جديدة على أحدث طراز في مجموعة بيانات NYT10. الكود ومجموعات البيانات المستخدمة في هذه الورقة متاحة على https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'pt': 'Este artigo explora como a Extração de Relação Supervisionada à Distância (DS-RE) pode se beneficiar do uso de um Gráfico Universal (UG), a combinação de um Gráfico de Conhecimento (KG) e uma coleção de textos em larga escala. Uma extensão direta de um modelo neural atual de última geração para DS-RE com um UG pode levar à degradação do desempenho. Relatamos primeiro que essa degradação está associada à dificuldade de aprendizado de um UG e, em seguida, propomos duas estratégias de treinamento: (1) Pré-treinamento Adaptativo do Tipo de Caminho, que treina sequencialmente o modelo com diferentes tipos de caminhos de UG para evitar a dependência de um único tipo de caminho UG; e (2) Mecanismo de Atenção Guiada de Classificação de Complexidade, que restringe a atenção de acordo com a complexidade de um caminho de UG de forma a forçar o modelo a extrair características não apenas de caminhos de UG simples, mas também de caminhos complexos. Resultados experimentais em conjuntos de dados biomédicos e NYT10 comprovam a robustez de nossos métodos e alcançam um novo resultado de última geração no conjunto de dados NYT10. O código e os conjuntos de dados usados neste artigo estão disponíveis em https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'ja': '本稿では、ユニバーサルグラフ（ UG ）、ナレッジグラフ（ KG ）と大規模なテキストコレクションの組み合わせを使用することによって、遠隔監視関係抽出（ DS - RE ）がどのように利益を得ることができるかを検討する。 UGを備えたDS - REのための現在の最先端のニューラルモデルの直接的な拡張は、パフォーマンスの低下につながる可能性があります。 まず、この劣化がUGの学習の難しさに関連していることを報告し、次に2つのトレーニング戦略を提案します。（ 1 ）単一のUGパスへの依存を防ぐために、異なるタイプのUGパスでモデルを順次トレーニングするパスタイプ適応前トレーニング。（ 2 ）複雑性ランキング誘導注意メカニズムは、UGパスの複雑さに応じて注意スパンを制限し、モデルが単純なUGパスだけでなく複雑なUGパスからも特徴を抽出することを強制する。 バイオメディカルデータセットとNYT 10データセットの両方の実験結果は、当社の方法の堅牢性を証明し、NYT 10データセットの新しい最先端の結果を達成します。 本稿で使用するコードおよびデータセットは、https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSREで入手できます。', 'es': 'Este artículo explora cómo la extracción de relaciones supervisadas a distancia (DS-RE) puede beneficiarse del uso de un gráfico universal (UG), la combinación de un gráfico de conocimiento (KG) y una colección de texto a gran escala. Una extensión directa de un modelo neuronal actual de última generación para DS-RE con una UG puede provocar una degradación del rendimiento. Primero informamos que esta degradación está asociada con la dificultad para aprender una UG y luego proponemos dos estrategias de entrenamiento: (1) Entrenamiento previo adaptativo del tipo de ruta, que entrena secuencialmente el modelo con diferentes tipos de rutas de UG para evitar la dependencia de un solo tipo de ruta UG; y (2) Complejidad Mecanismo de atención guiada de clasificación, que restringe la capacidad de atención de acuerdo con la complejidad de una ruta de UG para forzar al modelo a extraer características no solo de rutas de UG simples sino también de rutas complejas. Los resultados experimentales en conjuntos de datos biomédicos y NYT10 demuestran la solidez de nuestros métodos y logran un nuevo resultado de vanguardia en el conjunto de datos NYT10. El código y los conjuntos de datos utilizados en este documento están disponibles en https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'zh': '本文探讨了远程监督关系提取(DS-RE)如何从通用图(UG),知识图谱(KG)和大文本集合的组合中受益。 用UG直扩先进DS-RE神经或致性降。 先告此退化与学UG之难,然后为二策:(1)径自应,其用UG径以次教之,以防UG路之恃。 (2)复杂性排名引意机,以UG径之复杂性限意力跨度,使模形不特取于简UG径,而取特征于UG径之中。 生物医学、NYT10数集实验验吾法之稳健性,而NYT10数集上新之最先进也。 本文所用代码数集可在 https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE。', 'ru': 'В этой статье исследуется, как извлечение отношений с дистанционным надзором (DS-RE) может выиграть от использования универсального графа (UG), комбинации графа знаний (KG) и крупномасштабной текстовой коллекции. Прямое расширение современной нейронной модели для DS-RE с UG может привести к ухудшению производительности. Сначала мы сообщаем, что эта деградация связана с трудностями в обучении UG, а затем предлагаем две стратегии обучения: (1) адаптивное предварительное обучение типа пути, которое последовательно обучает модель с различными типами путей UG, чтобы предотвратить зависимость от одного типа пути UG; и (2) механизм управляемого внимания с ранжированием сложности, который ограничивает диапазон внимания в соответствии со сложностью пути UG, чтобы заставить модель извлекать признаки не только из простых путей UG, но и из сложных. Экспериментальные результаты как по биомедицинским наборам данных, так и по набору данных NYT10 доказывают надежность наших методов и достигают нового современного результата по набору данных NYT10. Код и наборы данных, используемые в этом документе, доступны по адресу https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'fr': "Cet article explore comment l'extraction de relations supervisées à distance (DS-RE) peut bénéficier de l'utilisation d'un graphe universel (UG), de la combinaison d'un Knowledge Graph (KG) et d'une collection de textes à grande échelle. Une simple extension d'un modèle neuronal actuel de pointe pour le DS-RE avec un UG peut entraîner une dégradation des performances. Nous signalons d'abord que cette dégradation est associée à la difficulté d'apprendre un UG, puis nous proposons deux stratégies de formation\xa0: (1) le pré-entraînement adaptatif du type de trajectoire, qui entraîne séquentiellement le modèle avec différents types de chemins UG afin d'éviter de dépendre d'un seul type de trajet UG\xa0; et (2) Complexité Mécanisme de classement de l'attention guidée, qui limite la durée d'attention en fonction de la complexité d'un chemin UG afin de forcer le modèle à extraire des entités non seulement à partir de chemins UG simples mais également à partir de chemins complexes. Les résultats expérimentaux sur les ensembles de données biomédicales et NYT10 prouvent la robustesse de nos méthodes et permettent d'obtenir un nouveau résultat de pointe sur l'ensemble de données NYT10. Le code et les ensembles de données utilisés dans ce document sont disponibles à l'adresse https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.", 'hi': 'यह पेपर इस बात की पड़ताल करता है कि कैसे दूरस्थ पर्यवेक्षित संबंध निष्कर्षण (डीएस-आरई) एक यूनिवर्सल ग्राफ (यूजी) के उपयोग से लाभ उठा सकता है, एक नॉलेज ग्राफ (केजी) और बड़े पैमाने पर पाठ संग्रह का संयोजन। एक यूजी के साथ डीएस-आरई के लिए एक वर्तमान अत्याधुनिक तंत्रिका मॉडल का एक सीधा विस्तार प्रदर्शन में गिरावट का कारण बन सकता है। हम पहले रिपोर्ट करते हैं कि यह गिरावट यूजी सीखने में कठिनाई से जुड़ी हुई है और फिर दो प्रशिक्षण रणनीतियों का प्रस्ताव करती है: (1) पथ प्रकार अनुकूली प्रीट्रेनिंग, जो क्रमिक रूप से विभिन्न प्रकार के यूजी पथों के साथ मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करता है ताकि एक ही प्रकार के यूजी पथ पर निर्भरता को रोका जा सके; और (2) जटिलता रैंकिंग निर्देशित ध्यान तंत्र, जो एक यूजी पथ की जटिलता के अनुसार ध्यान अवधि को प्रतिबंधित करता है ताकि मॉडल को न केवल सरल यूजी पथों से बल्कि जटिल लोगों से भी सुविधाओं को निकालने के लिए मजबूर किया जा सके। बायोमेडिकल और NYT10 डेटासेट दोनों पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम हमारे तरीकों की मजबूती को साबित करते हैं और NYT10 डेटासेट पर एक नया अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त करते हैं। इस पेपर में उपयोग किए जाने वाले कोड और डेटासेट https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE पर उपलब्ध हैं।', 'ga': 'Scrúdaíonn an páipéar seo conas is féidir leas a bhaint as Eastóscadh an Chaidrimh faoi Mhaoirseacht i gCian (DS-RE) as úsáid a bhaint as Graf Uilíoch (UG), as Graf Eolais (KG) agus as bailiúchán mórscála téacs. D’fhéadfadh díghrádú feidhmíochta a bheith mar thoradh ar shíneadh díreach ar shamhail néareolaíoch nua-aimseartha le haghaidh DS-RE le UG. Tuairiscímid ar dtús go bhfuil baint ag an díghrádú seo leis an deacracht a bhaineann le UG a fhoghlaim agus ansin molaimid dhá straitéis oiliúna: (1) Réamhoiliúint Oiriúnaitheach de Chineál Cosán, a chuireann oiliúint seicheamhach ar an tsamhail le cineálacha éagsúla cosáin UG ionas nach mbeifear ag brath ar cheann amháin. cineál cosán UG; agus (2) Meicníocht Aire Treoraithe Rangaithe Castachta, a chuireann srian ar an raon aird de réir chastacht cosán UG chun iallach a chur ar an tsamhail gnéithe a bhaint ní hamháin ó chosáin UG simplí ach freisin ó chinn casta. Cruthaíonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar thacair sonraí bithleighis agus NYT10 araon láidreacht ár modhanna agus baintear amach toradh úrscothach ar thacar sonraí NYT10. Tá an cód agus na tacair shonraí a úsáidtear sa pháipéar seo ar fáil ag https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány azt vizsgálja, hogy a Távol Felügyelt Relation Extraction (DS-RE) hogyan használhatja az Univerzális Graf (UG), a Tudásgraf (KG) és egy nagyszabású szöveggyűjtemény kombinációját. A DS-RE jelenlegi legkorszerűbb neurális modelljének egyszerű kiterjesztése UG-vel vezethet a teljesítmény romlásához. Először arról beszámolunk, hogy ez a degradáció kapcsolódik a UG tanulásának nehézségével, majd két tréning stratégiát javasolunk: (1) Path Type Adaptive Pretraining, amely sorozatban a modellt különböző UG utakkal készíti, hogy megakadályozza, hogy egyetlen UG útvonalra támaszkodjon; és (2) Komplex rangsorolás irányított figyelem mechanizmus, amely az UG útvonal összetettségének megfelelően korlátozza a figyelmet annak érdekében, hogy a modell nemcsak egyszerű UG útvonalakból, hanem komplex útvonalakból is kivonja a funkciókat. Az orvosbiológiai és NYT10 adatkészleteken végzett kísérleti eredmények bizonyítják módszereink robusztusságát és új, korszerű eredményt érnek el a NYT10 adatkészleten. A tanulmányban használt kód és adatkészletek az alábbi címen érhetők el: https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'it': "Questo articolo esplora come l'estrazione delle relazioni supervisionate a distanza (DS-RE) può trarre beneficio dall'uso di un grafico universale (UG), dalla combinazione di un grafico della conoscenza (KG) e una raccolta di testi su larga scala. Una semplice estensione di un modello neurale attuale all'avanguardia per DS-RE con un UG può portare a un degrado delle prestazioni. Prima riportiamo che questo degrado è associato alla difficoltà di apprendimento di un UG e poi proponiamo due strategie di formazione: (1) Path Type Adaptive Pretraining, che allena sequenzialmente il modello con diversi tipi di percorsi UG in modo da evitare l'affidamento su un singolo tipo di percorso UG; e (2) Meccanismo di Attenzione Guidata di Ranking Complessità, che limita la portata dell'attenzione in base alla complessità di un percorso UG in modo da costringere il modello ad estrarre caratteristiche non solo da percorsi UG semplici ma anche da quelli complessi. I risultati sperimentali su set di dati biomedici e NYT10 dimostrano la robustezza dei nostri metodi e raggiungono un nuovo risultato all'avanguardia sul set di dati NYT10. Il codice e i set di dati utilizzati in questo articolo sono disponibili all'indirizzo https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.", 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία διερευνά πώς η Εξύλιση Σχέσεων με Απομακρυσμένη Εποπτεία (DS-RE) μπορεί να ωφεληθεί από τη χρήση ενός Οικουμενικού Γραφείου (UG), τον συνδυασμό ενός Γραφείου Γνώσης (KG) και μιας μεγάλης κλίμακας συλλογής κειμένων. Μια απλή επέκταση ενός σύγχρονου νευρικού μοντέλου για DS-RE με UG μπορεί να οδηγήσει σε υποβάθμιση της απόδοσης. Καταρχάς αναφέρουμε ότι αυτή η υποβάθμιση σχετίζεται με τη δυσκολία εκμάθησης ενός UG και στη συνέχεια προτείνουμε δύο στρατηγικές κατάρτισης: (1) Προσαρμογή τύπου διαδρομής, η οποία εκπαιδεύει διαδοχικά το μοντέλο με διαφορετικούς τύπους διαδρομών UG, έτσι ώστε να αποφευχθεί η εξάρτηση από έναν ενιαίο τύπο διαδρομής UG. Μηχανισμός καθοδηγούμενης προσοχής, ο οποίος περιορίζει το εύρος προσοχής ανάλογα με την πολυπλοκότητα μιας διαδρομής έτσι ώστε να αναγκάσει το μοντέλο να εξάγει χαρακτηριστικά όχι μόνο από απλές διαδρομές αλλά και από σύνθετες. Πειραματικά αποτελέσματα τόσο σε βιοϊατρικά όσο και σε σύνολα δεδομένων αποδεικνύουν την αξιοπιστία των μεθόδων μας και επιτυγχάνουν ένα νέο αποτέλεσμα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας στο σύνολο δεδομένων. Ο κώδικας και τα σύνολα δεδομένων που χρησιμοποιούνται στην παρούσα εργασία διατίθενται στη διεύθυνση: https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз қашықтың қатынасын қайталау (DS- RE) қалай білетін график (UG), білетін график (KG) және үлкен мазмұның жинақтауын қолдануға мүмкіндік береді. UG- мен DS- RE үшін назардағы күй- жайындағы невралдық моделінің тез кеңейтуі болуы мүмкін. Біз біріншіден бұл деградацияны UG үйренуде көбірек болып, кейін екі оқыту стратегиясын ұсынамыз: (1) Жол түрі адаптикалық пререйнс, ол үлгісін бір түрлі UG жолдары арқылы көмектеседі, бір түрлі UG жолдарына сенімді сақтау үшін,  және (2) Бірақ толықтық түрлендіру бағыттау механизмі, бұл UG жолының түрлендірілігіне сәйкестігін шектеп, үлгісін тек қарапайым UG жолдардан емес, сондай-ақ комплекстерден шығаруға күту үшін үлг Биологиялық медицина және NYT10 деректер қорларының эксперименталдық нәтижелері біздің әдістеріміздің дұрыстығын көрсетеді және NYT10 деректер қорларының жаңа күйінің нәтижесін жеткізеді. Бұл қағазда қолданылатын код мен деректер жиындары бар https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნტის განსხვავება, როგორ განსხვავებული შესახებ განსხვავებული შესახებ განსხვავებული შესახებ განსხვავებული შესახებ (DS- RE) უნივერსალური გრაფის (UG) გამოყენებაზე, ცნობიერი გრაფის (KG) და დიდი DS-RE-ის მიმდინარე ნეიროლური მოდელის განსაზღვრება, რომელიც UG-ის შესაძლებელია, შესაძლებელია განსაზღვრებაში. ჩვენ პირველი შეგვიძლია აღწეროთ, რომ ეს დეგრადიაცია სხვა ტიპებით UG გზებით დაკავშირებულია და შემდეგ ორი სტრექტიკური სტრექტიკური სტრექტიკური გამოყენება: და (2) კომპლექტიური მონაცემების მონაცემების მექანსი, რომელიც UG გეზის კომპლექტიურობის შესახებ დასაჭირდება მოდელის გამოყენება არა მხოლოდ სუფლიო UG გეზებიდან, მაგრამ კომპლექტი ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგი ბიომედიციო და NYT10 მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში ჩვენი მეტოვების ძალიან ძალიან მოწმება და გავაკეთოთ ნYT10 მონაცემების კონფიგურაციას. ამ დაფაში გამოყენებული კოდი და მონაცემების კოდის შესახებ https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente nagrinėjama, kaip nuotolinio stebėjimo santykių ekstrakcija (DS-RE) gali būti naudinga naudojant universalųjį grafiką (UG), žinių grafiką (KG) derinį ir didelio masto tekstų rinkimą. Paprastai išplėtus dabartinį naujausią DS-RE nervų model į su UG gali sumažėti veiksmingumas. Pirmiausia pranešame, kad šis pablogėjimas yra susijęs su sunkumu mokytis UG, o vėliau siūlome dvi mokymo strategijas: 1) kelio tipo pritaikytas išankstinis mokymas, kuris iš eilės moko model į įvairių rūšių UG keliais, kad būtų išvengta priklausomybės nuo vieno tipo UG kelio; ir (2) Sudėtingumo klasifikavimo orientuoto dėmesio mechanizmas, kuriuo ribojamas dėmesio intervalas atsižvelgiant į UG kelio sudėtingumą, kad modelis priverstų ištraukti savybes ne tik iš paprastų UG kelių, bet ir iš sudėtingų. Eksperimentiniai biomedicinos ir NYT10 duomenų rinkinių rezultatai įrodo mūsų metodų patikimumą ir pasiekia naują naujausią rezultatą NYT10 duomenų rinkinyje. Šiame dokumente naudojami kodai ir duomenų rinkiniai pateikiami https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'mk': 'Оваа хартија истражува како Оддалечено надгледуваната врска екстракција (DS-RE) може да има корист од употребата на универзален граф (UG), комбинацијата на знање граф (KG) и голема текстова колекција. Едноставно продолжување на сегашниот најнов нервен модел за ДС-РЕ со УГ може да доведе до деградација на перформансата. Прво известуваме дека оваа деградација е поврзана со тешкотијата во учењето на УГ и потоа предложуваме две стратегии за обука: (1) Адаптивно преправање на типот на патеката, кое секвенцијално го обучува моделот со различни типови на УГ патеки за да се спречи зависноста од еден тип на УГ патека; и (2) Механизам за рајтинг на комплексноста, кој го ограничува процесот на внимание според комплексноста на патот на УГ за да го принуди моделот да ги извади карактеристиките не само од едноставните патишта на УГ, туку и од комплексните патишта. Експерименталните резултати на биомедицинските и НИТ10 податоци ја докажуваат силноста на нашите методи и постигнуваат нов најнов резултат на НИТ10 податоците. Кодот и датотеките кои се користат во оваа хартија се достапни на https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini mengeksplorasi bagaimana Ekstraksi Hubungan Dijaga Jauh (DS-RE) boleh berguna dari penggunaan Graf Universal (UG), kombinasi Graf Pengetahuan (KG) dan koleksi teks skala besar. Sambungan langsung bagi model saraf state-of-the-art semasa untuk DS-RE dengan UG mungkin menyebabkan kerosakan dalam prestasi. Kami laporkan pertama bahawa penghancuran ini berkaitan dengan kesulitan dalam mempelajari UG dan kemudian melamar dua strategi latihan: (1) Pelatihan Penyesuaian Jenis Laluan, yang secara berturut-turut melatih model dengan jenis laluan UG yang berbeza supaya mencegah bergantung pada satu jenis laluan UG; dan (2) Mekanisme Perhatian Panduan Rangkaian kompleksiti, yang mengharamkan jangkauan perhatian mengikut kompleksiti laluan UG supaya memaksa model untuk mengekstrak ciri-ciri bukan sahaja dari laluan UG sederhana tetapi juga dari laluan kompleks. Experimental results on both biomedical and NYT10 datasets prove the robustness of our methods and achieve a new state-of-the-art result on the NYT10 dataset.  Kod dan set data yang digunakan dalam kertas ini tersedia di https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നത് എങ്ങനെയാണ് ദൂരെയുള്ള ബന്ധപ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് (DS-RE) യൂണിവല്\u200d ഗ്രാഫ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന് DS-RE-ന്റെ നിലവിലുള്ള നെയുറല്\u200d മോഡലിന്റെ നേരിട്ടുള്ള ഒരു നീട്ടിയ വിശാലമായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിലേക്ക് കു നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നത് യുജി പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രയാസത്തോട് ഈ അപമാനം ബന്ധപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നീട് രണ്ട് ട്രെയിനിങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കുന് (2) സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണതയുള്ള റാങ്ങിംഗ് ഗൈഡ് ശ്രദ്ധ കാണിക്കുന്ന ഒരു യുജി പാത്തിന്\u200dറെ സംബന്ധിച്ച് ശ്രദ്ധ കാണിക്കുന്ന സാധനങ്ങള്\u200d അത് പരിഹരിക്കുന്നു. അതിനാല്\u200d മ ബൈയോമിക്കല്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെയും വിവരങ്ങളുടെയും പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രീതികളുടെ റോസ്റ്റിസ്റ്റ് തെളിയിക്കുകയും NYT10 ഡാറ്റാസറ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന കോഡും ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളും ലഭ്യമല്ല https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас хамааралтай хамааралтай холбоотой хамааралтай татах (DS-RE) хэрхэн Universal Graph (UG), Knowledge Graph (KG) болон том хэмжээний текст цуглуулга ашиглах талаар судалдаг. UG-тэй DS-RE-ийн орчин үеийн мэдрэлийн сэтгэл загварын шууд дэвшилт нь үйл ажиллагаанд унасан байх боломжтой. Бид эхлээд үүнийг UG суралцах хэцүү зүйлтэй холбоотой гэдгийг мэдэж байна. Тэгээд хоёр дасгал хөдөлгөөн стратегийг санал болгож байна. (2) Бүтээлтийн төвөгтэй удирдлагын механизм. Энэ нь UG замын төвөгтэй төвөгтэй байдлаар анхаарлыг хязгаарладаг. Тиймээс загварыг зөвхөн энгийн UG замын төвөгтэй байдлаас биш, мөн комплекс замын төвөгтэй байдлаас гаргах Биологийн эмнэлгийн болон НYT10 өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын үр дүн нь бидний арга замын чадварыг баталж, NYT10 өгөгдлийн сангийн шинэ урлагийн үр дүн гаргаж байна. Энэ цаасан дээр хэрэглэгдсэн код болон өгөгдлийн сангууд https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jesplora kif l-Estrazzjoni tar-Relazzjoni Mhux Sorveljata (DS-RE) tista’ tibbenefika mill-użu ta’ Graff Universali (UG), it-taħlita ta’ Graff tal-Għarfien (KG) u ġbir ta’ testi fuq skala kbira. Estensjoni sempliċi ta’ mudell newrali moderni attwali għal DS-RE b’UG tista’ twassal għal degradazzjoni fil-prestazzjoni. L-ewwel nirrappurtaw li din id-degradazzjoni hija as so ċjata mad-diffikultà fit-tagħlim ta’ UG u mbagħad nipproponu żewġ strateġiji ta’ taħriġ: (1) Pretraining Adattattiv għat-Tip ta’ Rotta, li sekwenzjalment iħarreġ il-mudell b’tipi differenti ta’ rotot ta’ UG sabiex tiġi evitata d-dipendenza fuq tip wieħed ta’ rotta ta’ UG; u (2) Mekkaniżmu ta’ Attenzjoni Gwida dwar il-Klassifikazzjoni tal-Kumplessità, li jirrestrinġi l-firxa tal-attenzjoni skont il-kumplessità ta’ mogħdija UG sabiex il-mudell jiġi mġiegħel joħroġ karatteristiċi mhux biss minn mogħdijiet UG sempliċi iżda wkoll minn mogħdijiet kumplessi. Riżultati sperimentali kemm fuq settijiet ta’ dejta bijomediċi kif ukoll fuq settijiet ta’ dejta NYT10 juru r-robustezza tal-metodi tagħna u jiksbu riżultat ġdid ta’ l-aktar avvanzat fuq sett ta’ dejta NYT10. Il-kodiċi u s-settijiet tad-dejta użati f’dan id-dokument huma disponibbli fuq https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł bada, w jaki sposób ekstrakcja relacji nadzorowanych na odległość (DS-RE) może skorzystać z wykorzystania wykresu uniwersalnego (UG), połączenia wykresu wiedzy (KG) i dużej kolekcji tekstów. Proste rozszerzenie obecnego najnowocześniejszego modelu neuronowego DS-RE o UG może prowadzić do degradacji wydajności. Najpierw zgłaszamy, że degradacja ta wiąże się z trudnościami w nauce UG, a następnie proponujemy dwie strategie szkoleniowe: (1) Adaptacyjny wstępny trening typu Path Type, który kolejno trenuje model z różnymi typami ścieżek UG, aby zapobiec poleganiu na jednym typie ścieżki UG; Mechanizm sterowanej uwagi, który ogranicza zakres uwagi w zależności od złożoności ścieżki UG, aby zmusić model do wyodrębniania cech nie tylko z prostych ścieżek UG, ale także z tych złożonych. Wyniki eksperymentalne zarówno na zbiorach danych biomedycznych, jak i NYT10 potwierdzają solidność naszych metod i osiągają nowy state-of-the-art wynik na zbiorze danych NYT10. Kod i zbiory danych zastosowane w niniejszym artykule są dostępne pod adresem: https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'no': 'Denne papiret utforskar korleis avstanden overvåka relasjonsekstrahering (DS- RE) kan nytte frå bruk av ein universell graf (UG), kombinasjonen av ein kjennengraf (KG) og ein stor tekstsamling. Ein enkelt utviding av eit nøyralmodell for DS-RE med eit UG kan føre til degradasjon i utviklinga. Vi rapporterer første at denne degradasjonen er forbunda med vanskeligheten i læring av ein UG og så foreslår to treningsstrategier: (1) Stiganype Adaptiv Pretraining, som følgjande treng modellen med ulike typar UG-baner slik at du kan forebygge tilbakekallinga på ein enkelt type UG-bane. Og (2) Kompleksitetsfarge hjelpetekstsmekanismenyen, som avgrenserer oppmerksområdet etter kompleksiteten av ein UG-bane slik at modellen skal tvinge å pakka ut funksjonar ikkje berre frå enkle UG-baner, men også frå komplekse baner. Eksperimentale resultat på både biomedisinske og NYT10-datasett viser kraftigheten av metodane våre og oppnår ein ny kunstresultat på NYT10-datasettet. Koden og dataset som brukar i denne papira er tilgjengelege på https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare explorează modul în care extracția relațiilor supravegheate la distanță (DS-RE) poate beneficia de utilizarea unui grafic universal (UG), combinația unui grafic de cunoaștere (KG) și o colecție de text la scară largă. O extensie simplă a unui model neural actual de ultimă generație pentru DS-RE cu UG poate duce la degradarea performanței. Raportăm mai întâi că această degradare este asociată cu dificultatea învățării unui UG și apoi propunem două strategii de formare: (1) Pretraining adaptiv tip de cale, care antrenează secvențial modelul cu diferite tipuri de căi UG astfel încât să prevină dependența de un singur tip de cale UG; (2) Mecanismul de atenție ghidată de clasare a complexității, care limitează intervalul de atenție în funcție de complexitatea unei căi UG astfel încât să forțeze modelul să extragă caracteristici nu numai din căi UG simple, ci și din cele complexe. Rezultatele experimentale atât pe seturile de date biomedicale, cât și NYT10 demonstrează robustețea metodelor noastre și obțin un nou rezultat de ultimă oră pe setul de date NYT10. Codul și seturile de date utilizate în această lucrare sunt disponibile la adresa https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir istražuje kako izvlačenje udaljenog nadzornog odnosa (DS-RE) može koristiti od koristi univerzalnog grafa (UG), kombinacije znanstvenog grafa (KG) i velike kolekcije teksta. Jednostavno produženje trenutnog neuralnog model a za DS-RE sa UG-om može dovesti do degradacije u izvedbi. Prvo izvještavamo da je ta degradacija povezana sa teškošću učenja UG-a, a onda predlažemo dve strategije obuke: 1) Adaptivno preliječenje tipa puteva, koji sekvenciji trenira model sa različitim vrstama UG-a kako bi spriječili pouzdanost na jednoj vrsti UG-a; i (2) mehanizam upozorenja kompleksnosti koji ograničava pažnju u skladu sa kompleksnošću UG puta kako bi prisilio model da izvuče karakteristike ne samo iz jednostavnih UG puteva, nego i od kompleksnog. Eksperimentalni rezultati biomedicinskih i NYT10 podataka dokazuju robotu naših metoda i ostvariju novi rezultat umjetnosti na NYT10 podataka. Kod i podaci koje se koriste u ovom papiru su dostupne na https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats undersöker hur Distantly Supervised Relation Extraction (DS-RE) kan dra nytta av användningen av en Universal Graph (UG), kombinationen av en Kunskapsgraf (KG) och en storskalig textsamling. En enkel förlängning av en aktuell state-of-the-art neural modell för DS-RE med UG kan leda till försämring av prestanda. Vi rapporterar först att denna försämring är förknippad med svårigheten att lära sig ett UG och föreslår sedan två utbildningsstrategier: (1) Path Type Adaptive Pretraining, som sekventiellt tränar modellen med olika typer av UG banor för att förhindra beroende av en enda typ av UG bana; och (2) Komplexitet Ranking Guided Attention mekanism, som begränsar uppmärksamheten beroende på komplexiteten hos en UG bana för att tvinga modellen att extrahera funktioner inte bara från enkla UG banor utan också från komplexa sådana. Experimentella resultat på både biomedicinska och NYT10 dataset bevisar robustheten hos våra metoder och uppnår ett nytt toppmodernt resultat på NYT10 dataset. Koden och datauppsättningarna som används i denna uppsats finns tillgängliga på https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu baaraanayaa siduu u faa’iido uga heli karo isticmaalka xarunta caalamiga ah (UG), soo wadashada Graf aqoonta (KG) iyo qoraal aad u weyn. Muuqashada toos u sii koritaanka ee xaaladda neurada ee hore ee DS-RE leh UG wuxuu noqon karaa mid ku hoosaysiiya sameynta. Marka ugu horeysa ayaannu wargelinnaa in dhibaatada barashada UG ay ku xiran tahay waxbarashada, kadibna waxaynu soo jeedaynaa laba strategies waxbarasho: (1) Jiid Adaptive Pretraining, taasoo dabadeedna u tababarida modelka ku tababarida wadooyin kala duduwan UG, si uu uga hor maro ku kalsoonaanta wadada UG; (2) Maamulka la hago dhegaynta, kaas oo ku xadgudba dareemada ku saabsan qasabka jidadka UG si uu u qasbo tusaalka si uu uga soo bixiyo qalabka fudud ee UG oo keliya, laakiin sidoo kale waxay ka kooban yihiin qalabka adag. Imtixaanka ku saabsan labada macluumaadka dhakhaatiirta iyo NYT10 waxay caddeysaa dhaqdhaqaalaha qaababkayaga iyo dhammaadka farshaxanka ee NYT10. Qoraalkan warqaddan lagu isticmaalayo waxaa laga helaa kaarka iyo macluumaadka https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கும் பொதுவான வரைப்படத்தை பயன்படுத்துவதிலிருந்து தூரத்தில் சேர்க்கப்பட்ட தொடர்பு வெளியீடு (DS- RE), அறிவு வரைபடத்தின் கூட்டுதல், ப Name @ info (2) சிக்கல் ஆரம்ப நேர்வழி காட்டப்பட்ட கவனத்தின் முறைமை, அது UG பாதையின் சிக்கல் பாதையை வரையறுக்கிறது, மாதிரியை வெளியேற்ற முடியாது, சிக்கல் பாதைகளிலிருந் சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் இருவரும் ஜையோமருத்துவ மற்றும் NYT10 தரவுத்தளங்களும் முறைமைகளின் துணிப்பை தெரியும் மற்றும் NYT10 தரவுத்தளத்த இந்த தாளில் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட குறியீடு மற்றும் தகவல் அமைப்புகள் கிடைக்கும் https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'ur': 'This paper explores how the distant Supervised Relations Extraction (DS-RE) can benefit from the use of a Universal Graph (UG), a Knowledge Graph (KG) and a large-scale text collection. ایک UG کے ساتھ ایک دھوپ کے ساتھ دھوپ کرنے کے لئے موجود state-of-the-art neural model کی ایک سیدھی اضافہ ہے۔ ہم پہلی بار راپور کرتے ہیں کہ یہ دھوکا ایک UG کی تعلیم میں مشکل ہے اور پھر دو تدریس استراتژی پیشنهاد کریں: (1) Path Type Adaptive Pretraining، جو اس کے بعد مدل کو مختلف طریقوں UG کے ساتھ تدریج کرتا ہے تاکہ ایک UG مسیر پر اعتماد کو روکنے کے لئے۔ اور (2) پیچیدگی رانڈ ڈھیٹ ڈھیٹ ڈھیٹ ڈھیٹ ڈھیٹ ڈھیٹ مکانیزی، جو ایک UG مسیر کی پیچیدگی کے مطابق توجه کی حفاظت سے محدود کرتا ہے تاکہ موڈل کو صرف ساده UG مسیروں سے نکالنے کے لئے مجبور کرے، بلکہ پی بیولوڈیکسیٹ اور نیویٹ 10 ڈیٹسٹ کے دونوں تجربے کا نتیجہ ہماری طریقوں کی طاقت ثابت کرتا ہے اور NYT10 ڈیٹسٹ پر نئی ایٹ کی نتیجہ پہنچاتا ہے. اس کاغذ میں استعمال کیا جاتا ہے کوڈ اور ڈیٹ سٹ https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'si': 'Name DS-RE සඳහා ප්\u200dරස්ථානයක් තියෙන සිද්ධ විස්තරයක්, UG එක්ක ප්\u200dරස්ථානයක් විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන්. අපි මුලින් වාර්තා කරනවා මේ විනාශය UG එක්ක ඉගෙන ගන්න අමාරුය සමඟ සම්බන්ධයි (1) ප්\u200dරශ්නය දෙකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා: (1) මාර්ගය ප්\u200dරශ්නය අනුමාණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ ව (2) සම්පූර්ණත්වය රැන්කින්ග් ප්\u200dරවේශනය ප්\u200dරවේශනය, ඒකෙන් අවධානය අවධානය අවධානය අවධානය අවධානය කරනවා UG මාර්ගයේ සංකෘතිය අනුවෙ ජීවිත වෛද්\u200dය සහ NYT10 දත්ත සෙට් දෙන්නම් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා අපේ විද්\u200dයාවයේ ශක්තිමතාවක් සහ NYT10 දත්ත සෙට මේ පත්තරේ භාවිත කරපු කෝඩ හා දත්ත සෙට් පුළුවන් https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz ajratish (DS-RE) umumiy Graph (UG), Known Graph (KG) va katta matn toʻplami birlashtirilgan foydalanishini aniqlaydi. Name Biz birinchi haqida buni UGni o'rganish qiyin bilan bog'liqdir va keyin ikkita ta'lim strategiya talab qilamiz:(1) Yoʻl turi Adaptive Pretraining va keyin uning turli UG yo'llari bilan modelni o'rganadi va bir bir guruh UG yoʻlini oldin ishni oldish uchun Bu UG yoʻlining murakkablarida murakkablik paydo bo'lgan murakkablik paydo bo'lgan komplikliklik boshqaruv tizimi, bu modelni faqat oddiy UG yoʻllardan foydalanish uchun oddiy UG yoʻllarini ko'rsatish va murakkab narsalardan foydalanish mumkin. Biotek va NYT10 maʼlumotlar tarkibida tajriba natijalarimizni ko'rsatadi va NYT10 maʼlumotlar sohasida yangi holatni bajarish natijasini bajarish mumkin. Ushbu qogʻozda ishlatilgan kodlash va maʼlumot satri mavjud emas https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này tìm hiểu làm thế nào mà chiết xuất tương quan giám sát xa xôi (DS-R) có thể hưởng lợi từ việc sử dụng đồ họa Toàn cầu (A.G), sự kết hợp của đồ hoạ tri thức (KG) và một bộ sưu tập văn bản quy mô lớn. Một phần mở rộng của mô hình thần kinh trung học hiện đại cho DS-R với A.G có thể dẫn đến sự thoái hóa trong khả năng của nó. Đầu tiên chúng tôi báo cáo rằng sự thoái hóa này được liên kết với khó khăn trong việc học một loại A.G. và sau đó đề xuất hai chiến lược đào tạo: 1) Diện mạo Kiểu Kiểu Thích nghi, mà theo loạt tiến trình được mô hình với các loại con đường G.I. khác nhau để tránh sự lệ thuộc vào một loại đường dẫn A.G. và (2) KCharselect unicode block name, điều đó thu hút sự chú ý phụ thuộc vào sự phức tạp của một đường dẫn A.G.I. để buộc mô hình phải khai thác các tính năng không chỉ từ các đường dẫn A.G đơn giản mà còn từ các đường dẫn phức tạp. Kết quả thí nghiệm trên cả các tập tin sinh học và NewYork đã chứng minh sự kiên cường của các phương pháp của chúng ta và có một kết quả mới trong bộ dữ liệu New York. Mật mã và các tập tin được dùng trong tờ giấy này có mặt tại https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'da': 'Dette arbejde undersøger, hvordan fjernsynet relation Extraction (DS-RE) kan drage fordel af brugen af en universel graf (UG), kombinationen af en vidensgraf (KG) og en storstilet tekstsamling. En ligetil udvidelse af en nuværende state-of-the-art neural model for DS-RE med et UG kan føre til nedbrydning i ydeevnen. Vi rapporterer først, at denne nedbrydning er forbundet med vanskeligheden ved at lære et UG og foreslår derefter to træningsstrategier: (1) Path Type Adaptive Pretraining, som sekventielt træner modellen med forskellige typer UG stier for at forhindre afhængighed af en enkelt type UG sti; og (2) Kompleksitetsrangering Guided Attention mekanisme, som begrænser opmærksomhedsspændet i henhold til kompleksiteten af en UG sti for at tvinge modellen til at udtrække funktioner ikke kun fra enkle UG stier, men også fra komplekse dem. Eksperimentelle resultater på både biomedicinske og NYT10 datasæt beviser robustheden af vores metoder og opnår et nyt state-of-the-art resultat på NYT10 datasættet. Kode og datasæt, der anvendes i dette dokument, er tilgængelige på https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir istražuje kako izvlačenje udaljenog nadzornog odnosa (DS-RE) može koristiti od uporabe univerzalnog grafa (UG), kombinacije znanstvenog grafa (KG) i velike skupine teksta. Jednostavno produženje trenutnog stanja neuralnog model a za DS-RE s UG-om može dovesti do degradacije u djelovanju. Prvo izvješćujemo da je ta degradacija povezana s teškošću učenja UG-a i onda predlažemo dvije strategije obuke: (1) Adaptivno preliječenje tipa putovanja, koja sekvenciji trenira model sa različitim vrstama UG-a kako bi spriječila pouzdanost na jednoj vrsti UG-a; i (2) mehanizam usmjerenog pažnje na kompleksnost, koji ograničava razinu pažnje u skladu s kompleksnošću UG-a kako bi prisilio model izvući karakteristike ne samo iz jednostavnih UG puteva, već i od složenih. Eksperimentalni rezultati biomedicinskih i NYT10 podataka dokazuju snagu naših metoda i ostvariti novi rezultat umjetnosti na NYT10 podataka. Kod i podaci koji se koristi u ovom papiru su dostupni na https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mengeksplorasi bagaimana Ekstraksi Hubungan DiSupervisi Jauh (DS-RE) dapat berguna dari penggunaan Graf Universal (UG), kombinasi Graf Pengetahuan (KG) dan koleksi teks skala besar. Sebuah ekstensi langsung dari model saraf modern-state untuk DS-RE dengan UG mungkin menyebabkan degradasi dalam prestasi. Kami pertama-tama melaporkan bahwa degradasi ini berhubungan dengan kesulitan dalam belajar UG dan kemudian melaporkan dua strategi latihan: (1) Path Type Adaptive Pretraining, yang secara urutan melatih model dengan tipe lain jalur UG sehingga mencegah pendekatan pada tipe satu jalur UG; dan (2) Mekanisme Perhatian Panduan Ranking kompleksitas, yang membatasi jangkauan perhatian menurut kompleksitas jalur UG sehingga memaksa model untuk mengekstrak fitur bukan hanya dari jalur UG sederhana tetapi juga dari jalur kompleks. Hasil eksperimental pada dataset biomedis dan NYT10 membuktikan kekuatan metode kita dan mencapai hasil terbaru pada dataset NYT10. Kode dan set data yang digunakan dalam kertas ini tersedia di https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'ko': '본고는 유니버설 그래프(UG), 결합지식도(KG)와 대규모 텍스트 집합이 원격 감독 관계 추출(DS-RE)에 대한 장점을 탐구했다.현재 최첨단 DS-RE 신경 모형을 UG로 직접 확장하면 성능이 저하될 수 있습니다.우리는 먼저 이러한 퇴화는 UG 학습의 어려움과 관련이 있다고 보고한 다음에 두 가지 훈련 전략을 제시했다. (1) 경로 유형은 예비 훈련에 적응하고 서로 다른 유형의 UG 경로 순서 훈련 모델로 단일 유형의 UG 경로에 의존하는 것을 방지한다.(2) 복잡성 정렬 부트 주의 메커니즘, 이 메커니즘은 UG 경로의 복잡성에 따라 주의 폭을 제한하여 모델이 간단한 UG 경로에서 특징을 추출할 뿐만 아니라 복잡한 UG 경로에서 특징을 추출하도록 한다.생물의학과 NYT10 데이터 세트에서의 실험 결과는 우리의 방법의 노봉성을 증명하고 NYT10 데이터 세트에서 최신 결과를 얻었다.본문에서 사용한 코드와 데이터 집합은https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия изследва как извличането на отдалечено наблюдение на отношенията (DS-RE) може да се възползва от използването на универсална графика (UG), комбинацията от графика на знанието (KG) и мащабна текстова колекция. Едно просто разширение на съвременния невронен модел за DS-RE с UG може да доведе до влошаване на производителността. Първо докладваме, че това влошаване е свързано със затрудненията при изучаването на УГ и след това предлагаме две стратегии за обучение: (1) Адаптивно предтрениране на тип Път, което последователно обучава модела с различни видове пътища на УГ, така че да се предотврати зависимостта от един тип Път на УГ; и (2) Механизъм за насочване на вниманието, който ограничава обхвата на вниманието според сложността на пътя на УГ, така че да принуди модела да извлича характеристики не само от прости УГ пътища, но и от сложни такива. Експерименталните резултати както върху биомедицинските, така и върху наборите от данни доказват здравината на нашите методи и постигат нов съвременен резултат върху набора от данни. Кодът и наборите от данни, използвани в тази статия, са достъпни на адрес: https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel onderzoekt hoe de Distant Supervised Relation Extraction (DS-RE) kan profiteren van het gebruik van een Universal Graph (UG), de combinatie van een Kennisgrafiek (KG) en een grootschalige tekstverzameling. Een eenvoudige uitbreiding van een huidige state-of-the-art neuraal model voor DS-RE met een UG kan leiden tot verslechtering van de prestaties. We rapporteren eerst dat deze degradatie samenhangt met de moeilijkheid om een UG te leren en stellen vervolgens twee trainingsstrategieën voor: (1) Path Type Adaptive Pretraining, die het model opeenvolgend traint met verschillende typen UG paden om te voorkomen dat afhankelijk wordt van een enkel type UG pad; en (2) Complexity Ranking Geleid Attention mechanisme, dat de aandachtsspanne beperkt volgens de complexiteit van een UG pad om het model te dwingen functies niet alleen uit eenvoudige UG paden te extraheren, maar ook uit complexe paden. Experimentele resultaten op zowel biomedische als NYT10 datasets bewijzen de robuustheid van onze methoden en bereiken een nieuw state-of-the-art resultaat op de NYT10 dataset. De in dit document gebruikte code en datasets zijn beschikbaar op: https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ تحقیق می\u200cکند که چگونه استخراج رابطه\u200cهای دور (DS-RE) می\u200cتواند از استفاده از گراف جهانی (UG), ترکیب گراف دانش (KG) و یک جمع متن مقیاس بزرگ سود دهد. یک استفاده مستقیم از یک مدل عصبی فعلی برای DS-RE با یک UG ممکن است به افزایش در عملکرد رخ دهد. ما اول گزارش می\u200cکنیم که این تغییرات با مشکلات یاد گرفتن یک UG ارتباط دارد و سپس دو استراتژی آموزش را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهیم: (۱) تغییر مسیر تغییر قابل توجه، که بعدش مدل را با نوع متفاوت از مسیر UG آموزش می\u200cدهد تا از توجه به یک نوع مسیر UG جلوگیری کند و (۲) مکانیسم توجه هدایت کردن پیچیدگی، که توجه را بر اساس پیچیدگی مسیر UG محدود می\u200cکند تا مدل را مجبور کند تا ویژه\u200cهای ساده UG را نه تنها از مسیر ساده بلکه از پیچیدگان پیچیدگی خارج کند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cی بیولوپزشکی و NYT10 داده\u200cهای ثابت می\u200cکنند قوی روش\u200cهای ما و نتیجه\u200cی جدید هنری در مجموعه داده\u200cهای NYT10 را بررسی می\u200cکنند. کد و مجموعه داده\u200cها که در این کاغذ استفاده می\u200cشوند در https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag wird untersucht, wie die Distant Supervised Relation Extraction (DS-RE) von der Verwendung eines Universal Graph (UG), der Kombination eines Knowledge Graph (KG) und einer großen Textsammlung profitieren kann. Eine einfache Erweiterung eines aktuellen neuralen Modells für DS-RE mit einem UG kann zu Leistungseinbußen führen. Zunächst berichten wir, dass diese Verschlechterung mit der Schwierigkeit verbunden ist, eine UG zu lernen, und dann schlagen wir zwei Trainingsstrategien vor: (1) Path Type Adaptive Pretraining, das das Modell sequentiell mit verschiedenen UG-Pfaden trainiert, um die Abhängigkeit von einem einzelnen UG-Pfad zu verhindern; und (2) Komplexitätsranking Geführter Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus, der die Aufmerksamkeitsspanne entsprechend der Komplexität eines UG-Pfades einschränkt, um das Modell zu zwingen, Features nicht nur aus einfachen UG-Pfaden, sondern auch aus komplexen zu extrahieren. Experimentelle Ergebnisse sowohl an biomedizinischen als auch an NYT10 Datensätzen belegen die Robustheit unserer Methoden und erzielen ein neues State-of-the-Art Ergebnis auf dem NYT10 Datensatz. Der in diesem Papier verwendete Code und Datensätze sind verfügbar unter https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz ýetiň Gözlemýän Relşiň Açmak (DS-RE) Universal Graph (UG), Bilim Grafikyň (KG) we uly ölçekli metin ýygnamasynyň işe yarandygyny gözləýär. DS-RE üçin Häzirki taryh neural nusgasynyň ýetişdirişi, bir UG bilen ýigrenişinde azalyp biler. Biz ilkinji gezek bu ýüregi UG öwrenmek kynçylyklary bilen baglanyp bilýäris we so ňra iki okuw stratejiýasyny teklip edip bilýäris: (1) Ýölegi Taýpi Adyt Ýöregi, bu nusgany UG ýoly bilen dürli ýoly bilen egzam eden ýoly üçin bir UG ýolyň bir hiline ynamlygy ýitirmek üçin ýöredip bil (2) Tamamlandyrylyk Dalga Görniş Metini, bu ýerde UG ýolunyň kompleksitesine görä üns berişi diňe basit UG ýolaryndan däl däldirmek üçin modelini süýtgetmek üçin gurnalandyrýar. Hem biomedical hem NYT10 veri setirlerinde örän netijeleri biziň metodlarymyzyň ýigrenligini kanıtlaýar we NYT10 veri setirlerinde täze bir ýagtylyk netijesini ýetirýärler. Bu kagyzda ullanýan köd we veri düzümleri bar https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም የግንኙነት አቀማመጥ (DS-RE) ከዩንቨርስቲ መዝገብ (UG), እውቀት ግራፍ (KG) እና ትልቅ የጽሑፍ ማቀናቀል እንዴት ይጠቅማል የሚችል ሆኖ ይፈልጋል፡፡ የአሁኑን የአሁኑን የ-የአሁኑን ደረጃ-የአሁኑን የ-የ-የአሁኑን ጠቋሚ ሞዴል ለDS-RE በተጨማሪው UG የሚያሳፍር ይችላል፡፡ በመጀመሪያ የምናስታውቀው ይህ አቁማጭነት በዩንግ ለመማር ጭንቀት ላይ ተገናኝቷል እና በኋላም ሁለት ተማሪዎችን strategy መዘጋጀት እናደርጋለን:(1) የመተላለፊያ ዓይነት አዳaptive ፕሬተርኔት፣ በኋላም ሞዴል በተለዩ ዓይነት የዩጂ መንገዶች ላይ ያስተምራል፣ በአንድ ዓይነት UG መንገድ ላይ መታመንን ለመከለከል ነው፡፡ (2) የውጤት ቀዳሚ የመራመ የኢንጂ መንገድ አካባቢ፣ የኢንጂ መንገድ አካባቢ እና ሞዴላውን ከቀላል UG መንገዶች ብቻ ሳይሆን እና ከጭንቀት ነው፡፡ የbiomedical እና የNYT10 ዳታተሮች ውጤቶች የሥርዓታችንን ቅድሚያ እና የNYT10 ዳታተር አዲስ የጥናት ፍሬት አግኝቷል፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ ውስጥ የሚጠቀሙት የኮድ እና ዳታ sets ተገኝቷል https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ուսումնասիրում է, թե ինչպես հեռավոր վերահսկված հարաբերությունների արտահանումը (DS-ER) կարող է օգտագործել Universal Graf (UG), Knowledge Graf (KG) և մեծ տեքստի հավաքածու համադրությունը: DS-RU-ի ներկայիս լավագույն նյարդային մոդելի պարզ ընդլայնումը UG-ով կարող է հանգեցնել դեգրադացիայի արդյունքում: We first report that this degradation is associated with the difficulty in learning a UG and then propose two training strategies: (1) Path Type Adaptive Pretraining, which sequentially trains the model with different types of UG paths so as to prevent the reliance on a single type of UG path;  և (2) բարդ դասակարգման ուղղությամբ ուշադրության մեխանիզմ, որը սահմանափակում է ուշադրության տարածությունը ըստ UG ուղի բարդության, որպեսզի ստիպեր մոդելը առանձնահատկություններ հանել ոչ միայն պարզ UG ուղիներից, այլ նաև բարդ ուղիներից: Experimental results on both biomedical and NYT10 datasets prove the robustness of our methods and achieve a new state-of-the-art result on the NYT10 dataset.  Այս թղթի մեջ օգտագործվող կոդները և տվյալների համակարգերը հասանելի են https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inagundua jinsi Utoa wa Kutokana na Uhusiano (DS-RE) unavyoweza kunufaika na matumizi ya Graph ya Kimataifa (UG), muunganiko wa Graph ya Ujuzi (KG) na mkusanyiko wa maandishi makubwa. Uongezeko wa moja kwa moja katika hali ya sasa ya a in a ya neura kwa ajili ya DS-RE yenye UG inaweza kusababisha kudhalilishwa katika utendaji. Kwanza tunaripoti kwamba udhalilishaji huu unahusiana na matatizo ya kujifunza Uingereza na kisha kupendekeza mbinu mbili za mafunzo: (1) Mfumo wa Tayari ya Utamaduni wa Jiji, ambayo baadae inafundisha mtindo huo na a in a mbalimbali za njia za UG ili kuzuia kutegemea njia moja ya UG; na (2) Mfumo wa Uchunguzi unaoongozwa na uangalizi, ambao unazuia hisia kwa mujibu wa utata wa njia ya Uingereza ili kuilazimisha muundo wa kuondoa vipengele sio tu kutoka kwenye njia rahisi za UG bali pia kutoka kwenye njia za tatizo. Matokeo ya majaribio yanayotokana na taarifa za kitabibu na NYT10 zinaonyesha ubakaji wa njia zetu na kupata matokeo ya hali mpya ya sanaa kwenye seti ya data ya NYT10. Kodi na taarifa zinazotumiwa katika gazeti hili zinapatikana katika https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি খুঁজে পাচ্ছে কিভাবে স্বয়ংক্রিয় সম্পর্ক বিস্তারিত সম্পর্ক (DS-RE) ব্যবহার করতে পারে বিশ্ববিদ্যুত গ্রাফ (UG), জ্ঞান গ্রাফ (কে. জি) এবং বিশাল DS-RE এর বর্তমান অবস্থার নিউরেল মডেলের সরাসরি এক্সট্রেন্ট প্রস্তুতি প্রদর্শনের ফলে প্রদর্শনীতে লাঞ্ছিত হতে পারে। আমরা প্রথম রিপোর্ট করেছি যে এই লাঞ্ছনা একটি ইজিজি শিক্ষা ব্যবস্থার সাথে যুক্ত এবং তারপর দুটি প্রশিক্ষণ কৌশলের প্রস্তাব করেছে: (1) পাথ টাইপ এডাপেটিভ প্রেট্রেনিক, যা পরবর্তীতে  (২) জটিলতা রেঙ্কিং রেঙ্কিং গোয়েন্দা শোনার মাধ্যম, যা একটি ইজিজি পথের জটিলতার অনুসারে মনোযোগ প্রদান করেছে, যাতে মডেলের বাধ্য করা হয়েছে সাধারণ ইউজিজি পথ থেকে ব বায়োমেডিকেল এবং এনয়াটি১০ ডাটাটাসেট উভয়ের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল প্রমাণ করে আমাদের পদ্ধতির প্রত্যাশা এবং NYT10 ডাটাসেটের নতুন রাষ্ট্রের ফলাফল অর এই কাগজে ব্যবহৃত কোড এবং ডাটাসেট পাওয়া যায় https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'af': "Hierdie papier ondersoek hoe die afstand ondersoek verhouding uitvoer (DS- RE) kan voordeel van die gebruik van 'n Universele Graf (UG), die kombinasie van 'n kennis Graf (KG) en 'n groot- skaal teks versameling. 'n Eenvoudige uitbreiding van 'n huidige staat van die kunste neurale model vir DS-RE met 'n UG kan lei na degradasie in prestasie. Ons rapporteer eerste dat hierdie afbreiding geassosieer is met die moeilikheid in die leer van 'n UG en dan voorstel twee optreidingsstrategies: (1) Pad Tipe Adaptief Pretraining, wat sekwensies die model met verskillende tipes UG pad trein om die vertrouing op 'n enkele tipe UG pad te voorkom; en (2) Kompleksie Geleide Aansig-mekanisme, wat die aandag-speletjie beperk volgens die kompleksiteit van 'n UG-pad, sodat die model verdwyn om funksies nie net van eenvoudige UG-paaie uit te pak nie, maar ook van komplekse een. Eksperimentale resultate van beide biomediese en NYT10 datastelle bevestig die kragtigheid van ons metodes en bereik 'n nuwe staat-van-kunste resultaat op die NYT10 datastel. Die kode en datastel gebruik word in hierdie papier beskikbaar by https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.", 'az': 'Bu kağıt uzaq gözləyirli İlişkilərin çıxartılması (DS-RE) üniversal Grafik (UG), Bilən Grafik (KG) və böyük ölçülü metin koleksiyonunun istifadəsindən fayda verəcəyini keşfetir. UG ilə DS-RE üçün hazırkı nürol model in in düzgün bir uzantısı performansında degradasyona yol a çar. Biz ilk dəfə belə bildiririk ki, bu degradasyon UG öyrənməsində çətinliklərlə bağlı və sonra iki təhsil stratejisini təbliğ edir: Və (2) Kompleksiya Ranking doğru yolu göstərən Attention mehānismi, bu, UG yolunun kompleksitəsinə görə dikkatini çəkir ki, modeli sadəcə olaraq UG yollarından və kompleks yollarından fərqləndirmək üçün məxluqatı çıxartmaq üçün maneçilik edər. İkisində də biomedicini və NYT10 veri quruları metodlarımızın güclüyünü kanıtlayır və NYT10 veri qurularında yeni incəsənət sonuçlarını başa çatdırar. Bu kağızda kullanılan kodlar və veri qurğuları https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'sq': 'Ky artikull eksploron se si ekstraktimi i marrëdhënieve të mbikqyrura nga largësia (DS-RE) mund të përfitojë nga përdorimi i një grafi universal (UG), kombinimi i një grafi të njohurive (KG) dhe një koleksioni teksti në shkallë të madhe. Një zgjerim i thjeshtë i një modeli neural aktual më të lartë për DS-RE me një UG mund të shpjerë në degradim në performancë. Ne së pari raportojmë se kjo degradim është i lidhur me vështirësinë në mësimin e një UG dhe pastaj propozojmë dy strategji trajnimi: (1) Udhëtimi i Tipit të Udhëtimit Adaptiv, i cili në mënyrë sekuenciale trajnon model in me lloje të ndryshme të rrugëve UG në mënyrë që të parandalojë mbështetjen në një lloj të vetëm rrugë UG; dhe (2) mekanizmi i renditjes së kompleksitetit të vëmendjes së udhëzuar, i cili kufizon zgjatjen e vëmendjes sipas kompleksitetit të një rrugë UG në mënyrë që të detyrojë modelin të nxjerrë karakteristika jo vetëm nga rrugët e thjeshta UG por gjithashtu nga a to komplekse. Rezultatet eksperimentale në të dhënat biomedikale dhe NYT10 provojnë fuqinë e metodave tona dhe arrijnë një rezultat të ri në të dhënat NYT10. Kodi dhe grupet e të dhënave të përdorura në këtë letër janë në dispozicion në https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'ca': "Aquest article explora com l'extracció de relacions remotament supervisades (DS-RE) pot beneficiar de l'ús d'un gràfic universal (UG), la combinació d'un gràfic de coneixement (KG) i una col·lecció de text a gran escala. Una extensió senzilla d'un model neural actualment més avançat per DS-RE amb un UG pot portar a una degradació en el rendiment. Primer informem que aquesta degradació està associada a la dificultat d'aprendre un UG i després proposem dues estratègies d'entrenament: (1) Predictoria adaptativa del tipus de camí, que seqüencialment entrena el model amb diferents tipus de camí UG per evitar la dependència d'un únic tipus de camí UG; i (2) Mécanisme d'atenció orientada a la classificació de complexitat, que limita l'interval d'atenció segons la complexitat d'un camí UG per forçar el model a extrair característiques no només de camí UG senzills, sinó també de camí complexos. Els resultats experimentals dels conjunts de dades biomèdics i NYT10 demostren la robustet dels nostres mètodes i aconsegueixen un nou resultat més avançat en el conjunt de dades NYT10. El codi i els conjunts de dades utilitzats en aquest article estan disponibles en https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir istražuje kako izvlačenje udaljenog nadzornog odnosa (DS-RE) može koristiti od koristi univerzalnog grafa (UG), kombinacije grafika znanja (KG) i velike kolekcije teksta. Jednostavno produženje trenutnog neuralnog model a umjetnosti DS-RE sa UG-om može dovesti do degradacije u izvedbi. Prvo izvješćujemo da je ta degradacija povezana sa teškošću učenja UG-a, a onda predlažemo dvije strategije obuke: 1) Adaptivno preliječenje tipa puteva, koja sekvenciji trenira model sa različitim vrstama UG-a kako bi spriječila pouzdanost na jednoj vrsti UG-a; i (2) mehanizam usmjerenog pažnje na kompleksnost, koji ograničava razinu pažnje prema kompleksnosti UG-a kako bi prisilio model da izvuče karakteristike ne samo iz jednostavnih UG-a, već i od kompleksnih. Eksperimentalni rezultati biomedicinskih i NYT10 podataka dokazuju robotu naših metoda i ostvariju novi rezultat umjetnosti na NYT10 podataka. Kod i podaci koje se koriste u ovom papiru su dostupne na https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis uuritakse, kuidas kaugjärelevalvega seotud ekstraheerimine (DS-RE) saab kasu universaalsest graafikust (UG), teadmisgraafikust (KG) ja suuremahulisest tekstikogust. DS-RE praeguse kaasaegse neuromudeli lihtne laiendamine UG-ga võib viia jõudluse halvenemiseni. Esiteks teatame, et see halvenemine on seotud raskustega õppida UG, ning seejärel pakume välja kaks koolitusstrateegiat: (1) Path Type Adaptive Eeltraining, mis treenib mudelit järjestikuselt erinevat tüüpi UG teed, et vältida sõltumist ühest tüübist UG teed; ja (2) Keerukuse järjestamise suunatud tähelepanu mehhanism, mis piirab tähelepanu ulatust vastavalt UG tee keerukusele, et sundida mudelit ekstraheerima funktsioone mitte ainult lihtsatest UG teedest, vaid ka keerukatest. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused nii biomeditsiinilistel kui ka NYT10 andmekogumitel tõestavad meie meetodite tugevust ja saavutavad NYT10 andmekogumil uue kaasaegse tulemuse. Käesolevas dokumendis kasutatud kood ja andmekogumid on kättesaadavad aadressil https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa selvitetään, miten etäohjattu suhdepoisto (DS-RE) voi hyötyä universaalin kaavion (UG) käytöstä, tietokaavion (KG) ja laajan tekstikokoelman yhdistelmästä. Nykyaikaisen DS-RE:n neuromallin suoraviivainen laajennus UG:llä voi johtaa suorituskyvyn heikkenemiseen. Ensin raportoimme, että tämä heikkeneminen liittyy vaikeaan oppimiseen, ja sitten ehdotamme kahta koulutusstrategiaa: (1) polkutyypin adaptiivista esikoulutusta, jossa mallia harjoitetaan peräkkäin erityyppisillä UG-poluilla, jotta vältetään riippuvuus yhdestä UG-polusta; ja (2) Complexity Ranking Guided Attention mekanismi, joka rajoittaa tarkkaavaisuutta UG-polun monimutkaisuuden mukaan pakottaen mallin poimimaan ominaisuuksia yksinkertaisista UG-poluista myös monimutkaisista. Kokeelliset tulokset sekä biolääketieteellisistä että NYT10-aineistoista todistavat menetelmien kestävyyden ja saavuttavat uuden huipputason tuloksen NYT10-aineistosta. Tässä asiakirjassa käytetyt koodit ja aineistot ovat saatavilla osoitteessa https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'cs': 'Tento článek zkoumá, jak může extrakce vztahů s dálkovým dohledem (DS-RE) mít prospěch z použití univerzálního grafu (UG), kombinace znalostního grafu (KG) a rozsáhlé sbírky textů. Jednoduché rozšíření současného nejmodernějšího neuronového modelu pro DS-RE o UG může vést k degradaci výkonu. Nejprve uvádíme, že tato degradace je spojena s obtížností při učení se UG a následně navrhujeme dvě tréninkové strategie: (1) Adaptivní předtrénink typu trasy, který postupně trénuje model s různými typy UG tras tak, aby se zabránilo spoléhání na jeden typ UG trasy; Mechanismus řízené pozornosti, který omezuje rozpětí pozornosti podle složitosti cesty UG tak, aby model extrahoval prvky nejen z jednoduchých cest UG, ale i ze složitých. Experimentální výsledky na biomedicínských i NYT10 datových sadách dokazují robustnost našich metod a dosahují nového nejmodernějšího výsledku na NYT10 datovém sadě. Kód a datové sady použité v tomto článku jsou k dispozici na adrese: https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'sk': 'V prispevku raziskujemo, kako lahko ekstrakcija oddaljenih odnosov (DS-RE) koristi od uporabe univerzalnega grafikona (UG), kombinacije grafikona znanja (KG) in obsežne zbirke besedil. Enostavna razširitev sedanjega najsodobnejšega živčnega modela za DS-RE z UG lahko povzroči poslabšanje zmogljivosti. Najprej poročamo, da je to poslabšanje povezano s težavami pri učenju UG, nato pa predlagamo dve strategiji usposabljanja: (1) Prilagodljivo predvadbo tipa poti, ki zaporedno usposablja model z različnimi vrstami poti UG, da se prepreči zanašanje na eno vrsto poti UG; in (2) mehanizem vodene pozornosti za razvrščanje kompleksnosti, ki omejuje razpon pozornosti glede na kompleksnost poti UG, tako da prisili model, da izvleče značilnosti ne le iz preprostih poti UG, ampak tudi iz kompleksnih. Eksperimentalni rezultati biomedicinskih podatkovnih naborov in naborov podatkov NYT10 dokazujejo robustnost naših metod in dosegajo nov najsodobnejši rezultat na naboru podatkov NYT10. Koda in nabori podatkov, uporabljeni v tem prispevku, so na voljo na spletni strani https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'he': 'העבודה הזו חוקרת כיצד החילוץ מערכת יחסים משומרת מרחוק (DS-RE) יכול להשתמש בגרף Universal (UG), שילוב של גרף ידע (KG) ואוסף טקסט ברמה גדולה. התאריך ישר של מודל עצבי מצוין כרגע עבור DS-RE עם UG עלול להוביל להשפיל ביצועים. אנו קודם מדווחים שההשפילה הזו קשורה לקשיקות בללמד UG ואז מציעים שני אסטרטגיות אימונים: (1) טיפוס מסלול מתאמן פנים מתאים, אשר באופן רצופי מאמן את המודל עם סוגים שונים של מסלולים UG כדי למנוע את תלויה על סוג אחד של מסלול UG; (2) Mechanism of Complexity Ranking Guided Attention, which limits the attention span according to the complexity of a UG path so as to force the model to extract features not only from simple UG paths but also from complex ones. תוצאות ניסויים על קבוצות נתונים ביומדיקאיות וגם ניו יורק-טי-10 מוכיחות את החזקה של השיטות שלנו ולהשיג תוצאה חדשה במידע ניו יורק-טי-10. הקוד והקבוצות נתונים המשתמשים בעיתון הזה זמינים ב https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'ha': "Wannan karatun na gane yadda the Distant Extraction of Relation (DS-R) zai iya amfani da amfani da littafin Narrafi (UG), da koma'in Narrafi (KG) da mai girma. Wani faɗi mai daidaita halin-halin-mai-yanzu wa DS-R da wata UG zai iya ƙara ƙasƙanci cikin aikin. @ action: button @ action: button Tajararin matsala ta sami bazariya da data na NYT10 ke jarraba ustawi na hanyoyinmu kuma ta sami wani halin-art matsalar kan danne na NYT10. KCharselect unicode block name https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.", 'jv': 'Pesene iki diputara piye soko kelompok Distantaly Monitor Relation extration (SS-REE) iso nggunakake nguasai Universal Graph (UG), ngregani UnknownGraph (KG) lan akeh sistem gambar textattr. lah Awak dhéwé mbéwé éntuk karo degradisi iki wis kelangan karo kesempatan kanggo ngilangno UG lan ujol-ujol kuwi tindakan dhéwé: politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Menu item to Open \'Search for Open Files\' dialog Bong https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.', 'bo': 'ཤོག UG ཅིག་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མིའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་གིས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་ཟམ། We first report that this degradation is associated with the difficulty in learning a UG and then propose two training strategies: (1) Path Type Adaptive Pretraining, which sequentially trains the model with different types of UG paths so as to prevent the reliance on a single type of UG path; and (2) Complexity Ranking Guided Attention mechanism, which restricts the attention span according to the complexity of a UG path so as to force the model to extract features not only from simple UG paths but also from complex ones. ཕྱོགས་དབུགས་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་དང་NYT10 གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སྒྲིག ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་སྤྱོད་པའི་ཨང་གྲངས་དང་གནད་སྡུད་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱིས་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ https://github.com/baodaiqin/UGDSRE.'}
{'en': 'Using and comparing Rhetorical Structure Theory parsers with rst-workbench', 'ar': 'استخدام ومقارنة محللات نظرية البنية البلاغية مع منضدة العمل الأولى', 'fr': 'Utilisation et comparaison des analyseurs de la théorie des structures rhétoriques avec rst-workbench', 'pt': 'Usando e comparando analisadores da Teoria da Estrutura Retórica com o rst-workbench', 'es': 'Uso y comparación de analizadores de teoría de estructura retórica con rst-workbench', 'zh': '用校修辞理解析器与rst-workbench', 'hi': 'का उपयोग करना और RST-workbench के साथ बयानबाजी संरचना सिद्धांत पार्सर की तुलना', 'ru': 'Использование и сравнение парсеров теории риторической структуры с rst-workbench', 'ja': 'Rhetorical Structure Theory構文解析器とrst - workbench構文解析器の使用と比較', 'ga': 'Parsairí Teoirice Struchtúr Reitrice a úsáid agus a chur i gcomparáid leis an gcéad bhinse oibre', 'it': 'Utilizzo e confronto dei parser retorici della teoria della struttura con il primo banco di lavoro', 'hu': 'Retorikus struktúra elméleti elemzők használata és összehasonlítása az első munkapadon', 'ka': 'რეტორიკალური სტრუქტურის ტეორიის პარასერების გამოყენება და შემდგენება', 'el': 'Χρήση και σύγκριση αναλυτών θεωρίας ρητορικής δομής με τον πρώτο πάγκο εργασίας', 'kk': 'Риторикалық структура теориясы талдаушыларын rst- жұмысқа салыстыру және салыстыру', 'lt': 'Using and comparing Rhetorical Structure Theory parsers with rst-workbench', 'ml': 'Rhetorical Structure Theory Parsers ഉപയോഗിക്കുകയും തുല്യമാക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു.', 'mt': 'Using and comparing Rhetorical Structure Theory parsers with rst-workbench', 'ms': 'Mengguna dan membandingkan penghurai Teori Struktur Rhetorical dengan bangku kerja pertama', 'mn': 'Риторикийн структур теорийн хуваарьтайгаар', 'no': 'Bruk og sammenlignar retoriske struktureteorieanalyserar med rst- arbeidsbank', 'sr': 'Koristeći i uspoređivati retoričke teorije analizatore sa prvom radnom klupom', 'ro': 'Utilizarea și compararea parserelor Teoria Structurii Retorice cu prim-workbench', 'si': 'රෙටෝරිකාල් සංවිධානය නිර්මාණය විශේෂකයෝ පාර්ස්ටර් එක්ක පාවිච්චි කරන්න සහ සම්මුති', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie i porównanie parserów teorii struktury retorycznej z first-workbench', 'so': 'Isku isticmaalidda iyo isbardhigidda qoraalka dhismaha ee Rhetorical Theory with rst-workbench', 'ta': 'ஆரம்ப- வேலைப்பென்க் கொண்டு ரெட்டோரிக் கட்டுப்பாட்டு பார்சர்களை பயன்படுத்தி ஒப்பிடுகிறது', 'ur': 'ریٹروریک ساختار تئوری ٹوریس پارچر کے ساتھ استعمال اور مقایسہ کرنا', 'sv': 'Använda och jämföra retorisk strukturteori tolkare med första arbetsbänken', 'mk': 'Користењето и споредувањето на анализаторите на теоријата на реторичката структура со првата работна банка', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Sử dụng và so sánh các nhà phân tích cấu trúc Rhetoric với ghế đầu', 'da': 'Brug og sammenligning af retorisk strukturteori fortolkere med first-workbench', 'hr': 'Koristeći i uspoređivati teorijske analizatore retoričke strukture s prvom radnom klupom', 'de': 'Verwendung und Vergleich von Parsern der rhetorischen Strukturtheorie mit first-workbench', 'id': 'Menggunakan dan membandingkan analis teori struktur Rhetorical dengan bench pertama', 'bg': 'Използване и сравняване на анализатори на реторичната теория на структурата с първата работна маса', 'nl': 'Het gebruiken en vergelijken van parsers van de Rhetorische Structuurtheorie met first-workbench', 'fa': 'استفاده کردن و مقایسه کردن بازرسان تئوری ساختار ریتریک با صندوق اول کار', 'tr': 'Pirst-iş bench bilen retorik struktur teoriýasyny ulanmak we karşılaştyrmak', 'sq': 'Përdorimi dhe krahasimi i analizuesve të teorisë së strukturës retorike me bankën e parë të punës', 'ko': '수사 구조 이론 해석기와rstworkbench의 사용과 비교', 'sw': 'Kwa kutumia na kulinganisha mabango ya Miundombinu ya Rhetorical with the first workbench', 'hy': 'Օգտագործելով և համեմատելով Ռետորիկական կառուցվածքի տեսության վերլուծումները առաջին աշխատավայրի հետ', 'af': 'Gebruik en vergelyking van retoriese struktuur teoriee verwerkers met rst-werkbank', 'az': 'Rhetorical Structure Theory parsers ilə', 'bn': 'রেটোরিক্যাল ক্ষেত্র থিওরি পার্সার ব্যবহার করা এবং তুলনা করা হয়', 'ca': "Utilitzant i comparant els analitzadors de la teoria de l'estructura retòrica amb el primer banc de treball", 'cs': 'Použití a porovnání analyzátorů teorie rétorických struktur s first-workbench', 'et': 'Retoorilise struktuuriteooria parserite kasutamine ja võrdlemine esimese tööpingiga', 'am': 'Rhetorical Structure Theory Parsers with rst-workbench', 'fi': 'Retorisen rakenneteorian jäsentäjien käyttäminen ja vertailu ensimmäiseen työpenkkiin', 'bs': 'Koristiti i uspoređivati retoričke teorije analizatore s prvom radnom klubom', 'jv': 'Ngawe ngubah karo nggambar Ketok Ribagian structural theores karo rst-workbench', 'he': 'השימוש ובהשוואה של מעבדות תיאוריות המבנה הרטורית עם הספסל הראשון', 'ha': 'Yi amfani da kuma ya daidaita parser na bakarãri na Retorical game da first-workbanch', 'sk': 'Uporaba in primerjava razčlenjevalnikov retorične teorije strukture s prvo delovno mizo', 'bo': 'Using and comparing Rhetorical Structure Theory parsers with rst-workbench'}
{'en': 'I present rst-workbench, a software package that simplifies the installation and usage of numerous end-to-end Rhetorical Structure Theory (RST) parsers. The tool offers a web-based interface that allows users to enter text and let multiple RST parsers generate analyses concurrently. The resulting RST trees can be compared visually, manually post-edited (in the browser) and stored for later usage.', 'fr': "Je présente rst-workbench, un progiciel qui simplifie l'installation et l'utilisation de nombreux analyseurs de bout en bout Rhetorical Structure Theory (RST). L'outil offre une interface Web qui permet aux utilisateurs de saisir du texte et de laisser plusieurs analyseurs RST générer des analyses simultanément. Les arbres RST résultants peuvent être comparés visuellement, post-édités manuellement (dans le navigateur) et stockés pour une utilisation ultérieure.", 'ar': 'أقدم منضدة العمل الأولى ، وهي حزمة برامج تبسط تثبيت واستخدام العديد من موزعي نظرية البنية البلاغية (RST) من طرف إلى طرف. توفر الأداة واجهة قائمة على الويب تسمح للمستخدمين بإدخال نص وتسمح لمحللي RST المتعددين بإنشاء تحليلات بشكل متزامن. يمكن مقارنة أشجار RST الناتجة بصريًا ، وتحريرها يدويًا (في المستعرض) وتخزينها لاستخدامها لاحقًا.', 'pt': 'Apresento o rst-workbench, um pacote de software que simplifica a instalação e o uso de vários analisadores da Teoria da Estrutura Retórica (RST) de ponta a ponta. A ferramenta oferece uma interface baseada na web que permite aos usuários inserir texto e permitir que vários analisadores RST gerem análises simultaneamente. As árvores RST resultantes podem ser comparadas visualmente, pós-editadas manualmente (no navegador) e armazenadas para uso posterior.', 'es': 'Les presento rst-workbench, un paquete de software que simplifica la instalación y el uso de numerosos analizadores de teoría de estructura retórica (RST) de principio a fin. La herramienta ofrece una interfaz basada en web que permite a los usuarios introducir texto y permitir que varios analizadores RST generen análisis simultáneamente. Los árboles RST resultantes pueden compararse visualmente, posteeditarse manualmente (en el navegador) y almacenarse para su uso posterior.', 'zh': '余言rst-workbench,此软件包也,可简诸端到端修辞结构(RST)解析器安用。 供一Web之界面,许用户输文本,多许RST解析器生分析。 生成之RST,可直观校也,手动而辑之(于浏览器中)储以资后用。', 'ja': '私は、多数のエンドツーエンドの修辞構造理論（ RST ）構文解析器のインストールと使用を簡素化するソフトウェアパッケージ、rst - workbenchを発表します。このツールは、ユーザーがテキストを入力し、複数のRSTパーサーが分析を同時に生成できるようにするWebベースのインターフェースを提供します。結果として得られたRSTツリーは、視覚的に比較、手動でポスト編集（ブラウザ内）し、後で使用するために保存することができます。', 'hi': 'मैं rst-workbench, एक सॉफ्टवेयर पैकेज है कि स्थापना और कई अंत करने के लिए अंत बयानबाजी संरचना सिद्धांत (RST) पार्सर के उपयोग को सरल बनाता है प्रस्तुत करते हैं. उपकरण एक वेब-आधारित इंटरफ़ेस प्रदान करता है जो उपयोगकर्ताओं को पाठ दर्ज करने की अनुमति देता है और कई आरएसटी पार्सर को समवर्ती रूप से विश्लेषण उत्पन्न करने देता है। परिणामी RST पेड़ों की तुलना नेत्रहीन, मैन्युअल रूप से पोस्ट-संपादित (ब्राउज़र में) और बाद के उपयोग के लिए संग्रहीत की जा सकती है।', 'ru': 'Я представляю rst-workbench, программный пакет, который упрощает установку и использование многочисленных сквозных парсеров теории риторической структуры (RST). Инструмент предлагает веб-интерфейс, который позволяет пользователям вводить текст и позволяет нескольким синтаксическим анализаторам RST генерировать анализы одновременно. Полученные RST-дерева можно сравнить визуально, вручную после редактирования (в браузере) и сохранить для последующего использования.', 'ga': "Cuirim rst-workbench i láthair, pacáiste bogearraí a shimplíonn suiteáil agus úsáid an iliomad parsálaithe Teoiric Struchtúr Reitrice (RST) ceann go ceann. Cuireann an uirlis comhéadan gréasán-bhunaithe ar fáil a ligeann d'úsáideoirí téacs a chur isteach agus ligeann do pharsálaithe RST iolracha anailísí a ghiniúint i gcomhthráth. Is féidir na crainn RST mar thoradh air sin a chur i gcomparáid le radharc, iad a iar-eagarthóireacht de láimh (sa bhrabhsálaí) agus a stóráil le húsáid níos déanaí.", 'ka': 'მე პირველი სამუშაო პროგრამის პროგრამის პროგრამის პროგრამის პროგრამის პროგრამის მომხმარებას და გამოყენებას გამოყენებს. Name შემდეგი RST ხელები შეიძლება ვიზუალურად შედგენა, ხელსაწყისად დარედაქტირებული (ბრაუზაში) და შემდეგი გამოყენებისთვის შენახვა.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζω ένα πακέτο λογισμικού που απλοποιεί την εγκατάσταση και τη χρήση πολλών αναλυτών θεωρίας ρητορικής δομής (ΡΣΤ). Το εργαλείο προσφέρει μια διεπαφή που επιτρέπει στους χρήστες να εισάγουν κείμενο και να επιτρέπουν πολλαπλούς αναλυτές να παράγουν αναλύσεις ταυτόχρονα. Τα δέντρα που προκύπτουν μπορούν να συγκριθούν οπτικά, να επεξεργαστούν χειροκίνητα (στο πρόγραμμα περιήγησης) και να αποθηκευτούν για μεταγενέστερη χρήση.', 'hu': 'Bemutatom az rst-workbench-et, egy olyan szoftvercsomagot, amely egyszerűsíti számos end-to-end Retorical Structure Theory (RST) elemző telepítését és használatát. Az eszköz webalapú felületet kínál, amely lehetővé teszi a felhasználók számára, hogy szöveget írjanak be, és lehetővé teszi, hogy több RST elemző készítsen elemzéseket egyidejűleg. A kapott RST fák vizuálisan összehasonlíthatók, manuálisan szerkeszthetők (a böngészőben), és későbbi használatra tárolhatók.', 'it': "Vi presento rst-workbench, un pacchetto software che semplifica l'installazione e l'utilizzo di numerosi parser end-to-end Retorical Structure Theory (RST). Lo strumento offre un'interfaccia web-based che consente agli utenti di inserire testo e consentire a più parser RST di generare analisi contemporaneamente. Gli alberi RST risultanti possono essere confrontati visivamente, manualmente post-modificati (nel browser) e memorizzati per un uso successivo.", 'lt': 'Pateiksiu pirmojo darbo banko programinės įrangos paketą, supaprastinantį daugelio eilinių retorinių struktūrų teorijos (RST) analizatorių įrengimą ir naudojimą. Įrenginys siūlo internetinę sąsają, leidžiančią naudotojams įvesti tekstą ir leisti keliems RST analizatoriams vienu metu generuoti analizes. Gauti RST medžiai gali būti lyginami vizualiai, rankiniu būdu po redakcijos (naršyklėje) ir saugomi vėlesniam naudojimui.', 'kk': 'Бірнеше ретторикалық структура теориясы (RST) талдаушыларын орнату және қолдануды қарапайым бағдарлама дестесін таңдадым. Бұл құрал пайдаланушыларға мәтін келтіруге мүмкіндік беретін веб- негіздегі интерфейсін және бірнеше RST талдаушыларының анализдерін жасауға мүмкіндік береді. Негізгі RST ағаштарын көрініс, қолмен өзгертілген (браузерде) ретінде салыстырып, кейін қолдану үшін сақтауға болады.', 'mk': 'Презентирам прва работна банка, софтверски пакет кој ја поедноставува инсталацијата и употребата на бројни анализатори од крај до крај на реторичката структура (RST). Инструментот нуди веб-базиран интерфејс кој им овозможува на корисниците да внесат текст и да овозможат повеќето RST анализирачи да генерираат истовремено. Резултатите на РСТ дрвјата можат да се споредат визуелно, рачно по-уредувано (во прелистувачот) и да се зачуваат за подоцна употреба.', 'ml': 'ഞാന്\u200d എസ്റ്റ്-വര്\u200dക്ക് ബെന്\u200dച്, ഒരു സോഫ്റ്റ്\u200cവെയര്\u200d പാക്കേജ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. അത് എണ്ണപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനും എളു ഉപകരണത്തിന്റെ ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d അനുവദിക്കുന്ന വെബ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഒരു വിനിമയമുഖം നല്\u200dകുന്ന @ info: status', 'ms': 'Saya perkenalkan bangku kerja pertama, pakej perisian yang mempermudahkan pemasangan dan penggunaan banyak penghurai Teori Struktur Rhetorik (RST) akhir-akhir. Alat menawarkan antaramuka berasaskan web yang membolehkan pengguna memasukkan teks dan membiarkan penghurai RST berbilang menghasilkan analisis secara bersamaan. Pohon RST yang berasal boleh dibandingkan secara visual, secara manual selepas-edit (dalam pelayar) dan disimpan untuk penggunaan kemudian.', 'mt': "Jiena nippreżenta l-ewwel bank tax-xogħol, pakkett tas-softwer li jissimplifika l-installazzjoni u l-użu ta' għadd kbir ta' analizzaturi tat-Teorija tal-Istruttura Retorika (RST) minn tarf sa tarf. L-għodda toffri interfaċċja bbażata fuq l-internet li tippermetti lill-utenti jiddaħħlu t-test u tħalli diversi analizzaturi RST jiġġeneraw analiżi fl-istess ħin. Is-siġar RST li jirriżultaw jistgħu jitqabblu viżwalment, manwalment wara l-editjar (fil-browser) u jinħażnu għal użu aktar tard.", 'mn': 'Би анхны ажлын банк, програм хангамжийг олон төгсгөлд нь Rhetorical Structure Theory (RST) судлаачидын суулгалтыг хялбарчилж, ашиглах програм хангамжийг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ багаж хэрэглэгчид текст оруулж, олон RST ажиллагчид шинжилгээ бүтээх боломжтой вэб-суурилсан интерфейс гаргадаг. Үүний үр дүнд RST мод нь харагдаж, гараараа өөрчлөгдсөн (браузерд) болон дараагийн хэрэглээнд хадгалж болно.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiam first-workbench, pakiet oprogramowania, który upraszcza instalację i użytkowanie licznych kompleksowych parserów teorii struktury retorycznej (RST). Narzędzie oferuje interfejs internetowy, który umożliwia użytkownikom wprowadzanie tekstu i pozwala wielu parserom RST generować analizy jednocześnie. Powstałe drzewa RST mogą być porównywane wizualnie, ręcznie edytowane (w przeglądarce) i przechowywane do późniejszego użycia.', 'sr': 'Predstavljam prvu radnu klupu, software paket koji pojednostavlja instalaciju i upotrebu brojnih retoričkih strukturnih teorija (RST) analizatora. Upravo nudi internetski interfejs koji omogućava korisnicima da uđu u tekst i dozvoli da višestruki razmatrači RST zajedno proizvode analize. Rezultatno drveće RST mogu se usporediti vizuelno, ručno nakon redikcije (u pretraživaču) i čuvati za kasnije upotrebe.', 'no': 'Eg presenterer rst-workbench, eit programvarepakke som forenklar installasjonen og bruken av mange retoriske struktureteorier (RST) tillesarar til slutt til slutt. Verktøyet tilbyr eit nettbasert grensesnitt som tillater brukarar å skriva inn tekst og la fleire RST-tolkarar laga analyser samtidig. Resultatet av RST-trene kan samanliknast visuelt, manuelt etter redigering (i nettlesaren) og lagrast for seinare bruk.', 'ro': 'Vă prezint rst-workbench, un pachet software care simplifică instalarea și utilizarea numeroaselor analize end-to-end Retorical Structure Theory (RST). Instrumentul oferă o interfață bazată pe web care permite utilizatorilor să introducă text și să permită mai multor analize RST să genereze simultan analize. Arborii RST rezultați pot fi comparați vizual, posteditați manual (în browser) și stocați pentru utilizare ulterioară.', 'si': 'මම පෙන්වන්නම්, සොෆ්ටවේර් පැකේජ් එකක්, අන්තිම අවසානය සහ භාවිතාවක් විශේෂය කරනවා රෙටෝරිකාල සංස්ථාපනය (RST) පරි Name ප්\u200dරතිචාර RST ගස්ස් වර්ගයක් දර්ශණික විසින්, අත්තර්ගයෙන් පස්සේ සංපාදනය කරලා තියෙන්න පුළුවන්.', 'sv': 'Jag presenterar rst-workbench, ett mjukvarupaket som förenklar installation och användning av många end-to-end Retorical Structure Theory (RST) parsers. Verktyget erbjuder ett webbaserat gränssnitt som låter användare skriva in text och låta flera RST-tolkare generera analyser samtidigt. De resulterande RST-träden kan jämföras visuellt, manuellt efterredigeras (i webbläsaren) och lagras för senare användning.', 'so': 'Waxaan soo wadaa qoraal-shaqaalaha, warqad software ah oo fudud u saxeynaya iyo isticmaalka qoraalka dhismaha dhismaha ee ugu dambaysta Rhetorical dhismaha (RST). Amoolku wuxuu bixiyaa Interfac Internetka ku saleysan, kaas oo isticmaalayaasha u ogolaada in ay sameeyaan qoraal qoraal, islamarkaasna ay sameeyaan baaritaano badan oo RST ah. Geedka RST ee sababta ah waxaa lagu barbaran karaa tusaale ahaan, bandhig-horaadka (browser) waxaana lagu kaydiyi karaa isticmaalka dabadeed.', 'ur': 'میں ایک سوفٹ ویرٹ بنچ کو پیش کرتا ہوں جو بہت سی انڈی-انڈ-انڈی ساختہ تئوریسی تئوریسی (RST) پارسر کے استعمال کو آسان کرتا ہے۔ تولیل ایک ویب بنیادی اینٹرفس پیش کرتا ہے جسے استعمال کرنے والوں کو متن داخل کرنا اجازت دیتا ہے اور بہت سے RST پارسر کو ایک دوسرے کے ساتھ تحلیل پیدا کرنا اجازت دیتا ہے. نتیجۂ RST درختوں کو visually, manually post-edited (in the browser) اور later use کے لئے ذخیره کیا جائے گا۔', 'ta': 'நான் முதல் வேலைப்பென்க், ஒரு மென்பொருள் தொகுப்பு, அது நிறுவுதல் மற்றும் பயன்பாட்டை எளிதாக்குகிறது பல முடிவில் இருந்து முடிவு ஆர்ட் கருவி வலை அடிப்படையிலான இடைமுகம் வழங்குகிறது, அது பயனர்கள் உரையில் உள்ளிட அனுமதிக்கும் மற்றும் பல RST பார்சர்கள் தற்போது ஆர்ட் @ info: whatsthis', 'uz': 'Men birinchi ish bench (RST) parserlarini oʻrnatish va ishlatishni soddalash uchun dastur paketini hozir qilaman. Name Name', 'vi': 'Tôi xin giới thiệu ghế cao nhất, một gói phần mềm giúp đơn giản việc lắp đặt và sử dụng nhiều nhà phân tích cơ cấu trúc Hồi giáo (RST) cuối cùng. Công cụ này cung cấp một giao diện dựa trên mạng cho phép người dùng nhập vào văn bản và cho nhiều phân tích RST cộng đồng. Những cây RST Kết quả có thể được so sánh trực tiếp, trực tiếp sau sửa (trong trình duyệt) và được cất giữ để sử dụng sau.', 'hr': 'Predstavljam prvu radnu klupu, software paket koji jednostavlja instalaciju i upotrebu brojnih retoričkih strukturnih teorija (RST) analizatora. Uprava nudi internetski interfejs kojim korisnici omogućavaju ulazak teksta i dozvoliti višestrukim razmatračima RST-a istovremeno proizvesti analize. Rezultatno drveće RST mogu se usporediti vizualno, ručno nakon redaktovanja (u pretraživaču) i čuvati za kasnije uporabe.', 'nl': 'Ik presenteer first-workbench, een softwarepakket dat de installatie en het gebruik van tal van end-to-end Rhetorical Structural Theory (RST) parsers vereenvoudigt. De tool biedt een webgebaseerde interface waarmee gebruikers tekst kunnen invoeren en meerdere RST parsers tegelijkertijd analyses kunnen genereren. De resulterende RST-bomen kunnen visueel worden vergeleken, handmatig worden bewerkt (in de browser) en opgeslagen voor later gebruik.', 'id': 'I present rst-workbench, a software package that simplifies the installation and usage of numerous end-to-end Rhetorical Structure Theory (RST) parsers.  Alat ini menawarkan antarmuka berdasarkan web yang memungkinkan pengguna untuk memasukkan teks dan membiarkan penganalis RST berbilang menghasilkan analisis secara bersamaan. Pohon RST yang hasilnya dapat dibandingkan secara visual, secara manual post-edit (dalam perambar) dan disimpan untuk penggunaan kemudian.', 'bg': 'Представям ви софтуерен пакет, който опростява инсталирането и използването на множество анализатори от край до край. Инструментът предлага уеб-базиран интерфейс, който позволява на потребителите да въвеждат текст и да позволяват на множество анализатори да генерират анализи едновременно. Получените дървета могат да бъдат сравнявани визуално, ръчно пост-редактирани (в браузъра) и съхранявани за по-късна употреба.', 'da': 'Jeg præsenterer rst-workbench, en softwarepakke, der forenkler installation og brug af talrige end-to-end Retorical Structure Theory (RST) parsere. Værktøjet tilbyder en webbaseret grænseflade, der giver brugerne mulighed for at indtaste tekst og lade flere RST-fortolkere generere analyser samtidig. De resulterende RST træer kan sammenlignes visuelt, manuelt efterredigeres (i browseren) og gemmes til senere brug.', 'ko': '저는rstworkbench를 소개했는데 이것은 소프트웨어 패키지로 많은 단말기부터 단말기까지의 수사 구조 이론(rst) 해석기의 설치와 사용을 간소화할 수 있습니다.이 도구는 사용자가 텍스트를 입력할 수 있고 여러 RST 해석기가 동시에 분석을 생성할 수 있는 웹 기반 인터페이스를 제공합니다.생성된 RST 트리는 시각적 비교, 브라우저에서 수동 사후 편집을 수행하여 나중에 사용할 수 있도록 저장할 수 있습니다.', 'sw': 'Ninawasilisha benki ya kwanza ya kazi, paketi ya programu inayorahisisha kuweka na matumizi ya mabunge mengi ya miundombinu ya mwisho (RST). Kifaa hicho kinatoa mtandao wa intaneti ambacho kinaruhusu watumiaji kuingia maandishi na kuwaruhusu mabango kadhaa ya RST kutengeneza uchambuzi wakati huo. Matokeo ya RST yanaweza kulinganishwa na kuonekana, imehaririwa kwa manufaa (kwenye browser) na yaliyohifadhiwa kwa matumizi ya baadaye.', 'de': 'Ich präsentiere first-workbench, ein Softwarepaket, das die Installation und Nutzung zahlreicher End-to-End Rhetorical Structural Theory (RST) Parser vereinfacht. Das Tool bietet eine webbasierte Oberfläche, die es Benutzern ermöglicht, Text einzugeben und mehrere RST-Parser gleichzeitig Analysen generieren zu lassen. Die resultierenden RST-Bäume können visuell verglichen, manuell nachbearbeitet (im Browser) und für die spätere Verwendung gespeichert werden.', 'af': "Ek voorsien rst-werkbank, 'n sagteware pakket wat die installasie en gebruik van veelvuldige end-to-end retoriese struktuur teoriee (RST) verwerkers vereenvoudig. Name Die resulteerde RST bome kan visual vergelyk word, handmatik post-redigeerde (in die blaaier) en gestoor word vir later gebruik.", 'sq': 'Unë prezantoj bazën e parë të punës, një paketë softueresh që thjeshton instalimin dhe përdorimin e shumë analizuesve të teorisë së strukturës retorike (RST). Mjet ofron një interfaqe bazuar në internet që lejon përdoruesit të hyjnë tekst dhe të lejojnë analizuesit e shumëfishtë RST të gjenerojnë analiza në të njëjtën kohë. Pemët e RST që rezultojnë mund të krahasohen vizualisht, me dorë pas editimit (në shfletues) dhe të ruajtura për përdorim më vonë.', 'am': 'የመጀመሪያ-workbench፣ የሶፍትዌር ጥቅል ግንቡን እና የተጨማሪውን የመጨረሻ መሠረት ታሪክ (RST) ፓርስር የሚያስተካክል ነው፡፡ tool-options-action የRST ዛፎች በተያያየ፣ በጃንደረባ በፖስታ ማቀናጃ (በመቃኛው) እና ለኋላው መጠቀሚያ ለመጠበቅ ይችላል፡፡', 'fa': 'من یک بسته نرم\u200cافزار پیش\u200cفرض می\u200cکنم که نصب و استفاده از تئوری ساختار ریتریک (RST) بسته\u200cای را ساده می\u200cکند. Name درختهای نتیجه RST می\u200cتوانند به صورت تصویری، از دستی بعد از ویرایش (در برجشنگر) مقایسه شوند و برای استفاده بعدی ذخیره شوند.', 'tr': 'First-workbench, birnäçe Rhetorical Structure Theory (RST) çykyşçylaryň gurulmasyny we ullanmasyny kolaylaştyran bir softwaryň paketleri tanyşdyrýaryn. Bu araç Ullançylaryň metin girişine mümkin edýän web-den bir interfeje teklip edýär we birnäçe RST tansçylaryň hemişe analyzlary bejermesine rugsat berýär. Näme üçin RST agaçlary görnüş görnüşde, elinden soňra edit edilen (ahtarçynda) we soňra ulanmak üçin gaýd edilsin.', 'az': "Mən bir çox bitkilərin rotorik Structure Theory (RST) analizacıların qurulmasını və istifadəsini asanlaşdırır. Bu araç istifadəçilərin metin girməsinə izin verir və çoxlu RST ayırıcıların birlikdə analizi yaratmasına izin verir. Növbəti RST ağaçları görsel, əlində düzəldilən (browser'da) və sonrakı istifadə üçün qoruya bilər.", 'bs': 'Predstavljam prvu radnu klupu, software paket koji jednostavlja instalaciju i upotrebu brojnih retoričkih strukturnih teorija (RST) analizatora. Uprava nudi internetski interfejs koji omogućava korisnicima da uključe tekst i dozvoli da više razmatrača RST-a istovremeno proizvode analize. Rezultatno drveće RST mogu se usporediti vizualno, ručno nakon redaktovanja (u pretraživaču) i čuvati za kasnije upotrebe.', 'ca': "Presento un paquet de software que simplifica la instal·lació i l'ús de molts analitzadors de la Teoria de l'Estructura Retòrica (RST). L'eina ofereix una interfície basada en la Web que permet als usuaris introduir text i permet que múltiples analitzadors RST generin anàlisis simultàneament. Els arbres RST resultants es poden comparar visualment, posteditats manualment (al navegador) i emmagatzemar-se per a un ús posterior.", 'cs': 'Představuji first-workbench, softwarový balíček, který zjednodušuje instalaci a použití mnoha end-to-end parserů teorie rétorických struktur (RST). Nástroj nabízí webové rozhraní, které umožňuje uživatelům zadávat text a umožňuje více RST parserů generovat analýzy současně. Výsledné RST stromy lze vizuálně porovnat, ručně upravit (v prohlížeči) a uložit pro pozdější použití.', 'et': 'Esitlen esimest tööpinda, tarkvarapaketti, mis lihtsustab paljude retoorilise struktuuri teooria (RST) parserite paigaldamist ja kasutamist. Tööriist pakub veebipõhist liidest, mis võimaldab kasutajatel sisestada teksti ja lasta mitmel RST parseril analüüse koostada. Saadud RST puid saab visuaalselt võrrelda, käsitsi järeltediteerida (brauseris) ja salvestada hilisemaks kasutamiseks.', 'fi': 'Esittelen rst-workbench -ohjelmistopaketin, joka yksinkertaistaa useiden end-to-end Retorical Structure Theory (RST) -jäsentäjien asennusta ja käyttöä. Työkalu tarjoaa verkkopohjaisen käyttöliittymän, jonka avulla käyttäjät voivat syöttää tekstiä ja antaa useiden RST-jäsennysten tuottaa analyysejä samanaikaisesti. Tuloksena olevia RST-puita voidaan vertailla visuaalisesti, manuaalisesti jälkimuokattuna (selaimessa) ja tallentaa myöhempää käyttöä varten.', 'hy': 'I present rst-workbench, a software package that simplifies the installation and usage of numerous end-to-end Rhetorical Structure Theory (RST) parsers.  Այս գործիքը ներկայացնում է վեբ-հիմնված ինտերֆեյս, որը թույլ է տալիս օգտագործողներին մտնել տեքստ և թույլ է տալիս բազմաթիվ ՌՍԹ վերլուծողներին միաժամանակ վերլուծություններ ստեղծել: The resulting RST trees can be compared visually, manually post-edited (in the browser) and stored for later usage.', 'bn': 'আমি প্রথম-ওয়ার্ক বেঞ্চ, একটি সফটওয়্যার প্যাকেজ, যা বেশ কয়েকটি শেষ পর্যন্ত প্রতিষ্ঠান এবং শেষ পর্যন্ত প্রতিষ্ঠান থিওর (RST) পার্সারের ইনস টুলটি একটি ওয়েব ভিত্তিক ইন্টারফেস প্রদান করে যা ব্যবহারকারীদের টেক্সট লিখে লেখার অনুমতি দেয় এবং একই সাথে আরস্টি পার্সারের ব এর ফলে RST গাছগুলো দৃশ্যমান, হাতে পোস্ট-সম্পাদক (ব্রাউজারে) তুলনা করা যাবে এবং পরে ব্যবহারের জন্য সংরক্ষণ করা যাবে।', 'jv': 'Aku gak nggawe st-workbench, pakek perangkat software sing semplikasi Instalané karo gambar akeh liyane end-to-end Tool Options Punika Anyar', 'ha': 'Ina yanzu banch-aiki na farko, wani akwatin ayuka na shirya shirin ayuka da ke amfani da shiryoyin ayuka masu yawa na ƙari-zuwa-bakin rubutun na RSta. Wannan shirin ya bãyar da wani interfekt wanda aka asansa a web, wanda yana yarda da masu amfani da su shiga matsayi kuma ya bar parser masu yawa na RSS su ƙiƙiro analyi sami. Ana iya samfanar itãcen RS da ake ƙara zuwa gane, da hannun-edited (cikin biraw) da aka adana wa amfani da ke ƙara.', 'sk': 'Predstavljam vam prvo delovno mizo, programski paket, ki poenostavlja namestitev in uporabo številnih razčlenjevalnikov iz konca do konca Retorične teorije strukture (RST). Orodje ponuja spletni vmesnik, ki uporabnikom omogoča vnos besedila in omogoča, da več razčlenjevalnikov RST ustvarijo analize hkrati. Nastala drevesa RST je mogoče vizualno primerjati, ročno po urejanju (v brskalniku) in shraniti za kasnejšo uporabo.', 'bo': 'I present rst-workbench, a software package that simplifies the installation and usage of numerous end-to-end Rhetorical Structure Theory (RST) parsers. The tool offers a web-based interface that allows users to enter text and let multiple RST parsers generate analyses concurrently. ཐོབ་པའི་RST སྡོང་རིས་ལ་མཐོང་ནུས་མེད་པར་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་པའམ་ལག་བཟོས་ཆས།', 'he': 'אני מציג את הספסל הראשון, חבילת תוכנה שמפשטת את ההתקנה והשימוש של מספר חוקרי תיאוריה של מבנה רטורי (RST). הכלי מציע ממשק מבוסס באינטרנט שמאפשר למשתמשים להכניס טקסט ולאפשר למחקר RST מרובים לייצר ניתוחים באותו זמן. עצי RST הנוצאים יכולים להשוות באופן חזותי, באופן ידני לאחר העורר (בדפאזר) ולאחסון לשימוש מאוחר יותר.'}
{'en': 'MATILDA-Multi-AnnoTator multi-language InteractiveLight-weight Dialogue Annotator', 'ar': 'ماتيلدا - المعلق متعدد اللغات التفاعلية الخفيفة الوزن الحوار التوضيحي', 'pt': 'MATILDA - Multi-AnnoTator multi-language InteractiveLight-weight Dialogue Annotator', 'fr': 'MATILDA - Annotateur de dialogue léger interactif multilingue multi-annotateur', 'es': 'MATILDA - Anotador multilenguaje interactivo de diálogos livianos multilenguaje', 'ja': 'MATILDA - Multi - AnnoTator多言語インタラクティブLight - Weightダイアログアノテーター', 'zh': '明德 - 多名录多言互动轻量级语旁注器', 'hi': 'MATILDA - मल्टी-AnnoTator बहु भाषा InteractiveLight-वजन संवाद Annotator', 'ru': 'MATILDA - многоязычный интерактивный диалоговый аннотатор MultiAnnoTator', 'ga': 'MATILDA - Anótálaí Idirphlé Idirghníomhach éadrom-mheáchan Il-AnoTator', 'hu': 'MATILDA - Multi-AnnoTator többnyelvű InteractiveLight-weight Dialogue Annotator', 'el': 'MATILDA. Πολυ- Annotator πολυ-languageInteractiveLight-weight Dialogue Annotator', 'it': 'MATILDA - Multi-AnnoTator multi-language InteractiveLight-weight Dialogue Annotator', 'kk': 'MATILDA - Көптеген жазбалаушы көптеген тілдер интерактивті ашық- қатты диалогты жазбалаушы', 'ka': 'MATILDA - Multi- AnnoTator multi- language InteractiveLight- weight Dialog Annotator', 'mk': 'MATILDA - Multi- AnnoTator multilingueLight- weight Dialogue Annotator', 'ml': 'MATILDA - Multi- AnnoTator multi- language interactivelight- weight Dialog Annotator', 'lt': 'Comment', 'mn': 'MATILDA - Олон-Аннотатор олон хэлний интерактив гэрлийн жингийн диалог аннотатор', 'mt': "MATILDA - Annotatur ta' Djalogu b'Piż Ħfief Interattiv Multi-AnnoTator", 'no': 'MATILDA – Multi-AnnoTator multi-language InteractiveLight-weight dialog annotator', 'ms': 'MATILDA - Multi-AnnoTator Multi-language InteractiveLight-weight Dialog Annotator', 'ro': 'MATILDA - Multi-AnnoTator interactiv multi-languageLight-weight Dialogue Annotator', 'pl': 'MATILDA.Multi-AnnoTator multi-language InteractiveLight-weight Dialogue Annotator', 'sr': 'MATILDA - Multi-AnnoTator multi-jezički interaktivni lagani dialog Annotator', 'si': 'MATILDA - Multi- AnoTator Multi- language Interctive Light- weight dialog Notes', 'ta': 'MATILDA - பல- AnnoTator பல- language interactiveLight- weight Dialog Annotator', 'sv': 'MATILDA - Multi-AnnoTator flerspråkig interaktivLättvikt Dialogue Annotator', 'ur': 'MATILDA - Multi- AnnoTator multi- language InteractiveLight- weight Dialog Annotator', 'so': 'MATILDA - Annotator Multi-AnnoTator InteractiveLight-weight Dialog Annotator', 'uz': 'Light- weight Dialog Annotator', 'vi': 'Sắp xếp Sắp hàng đa ngôn ngữ tương tác Name', 'nl': 'MATILDA.Multi-AnnoTator multi-language InteractiveLight-weight Dialogue Annotator', 'bg': 'МАТИЛДА - Многоезична интерактивност Многоезична интерактивност', 'da': 'MATILDA - Multi-AnnoTator multi-language InteractiveLight-weight Dialogue Annotator', 'hr': 'MATILDA - Annotator višejezičkog interaktivnog dijaloga za laku težinu', 'fa': 'MATILDA - نشان\u200cدهنده\u200cی محاورۀ سنگین\u200cسبک\u200cگرایی چند زبان', 'ko': 'MATILDA- 다중 메모 다중 언어 상호 작용 경량 대화 메모', 'de': 'MATILDA.Multi-AnnoTator multi-language InteractiveLight-weight Dialogue Annotator', 'id': 'MATILDA - Multi-AnnoTator multi-language InteractiveLight-weight Dialogue Annotator', 'tr': 'MATILDA', 'sw': 'Light-weight Dialogue Annotator', 'af': 'MATILDA - Multi- AnnoTator multi- language InteractiveLight- weight Dialog Annotator', 'sq': 'MATILDA - Multi-AnnoTator InteraktiveLight-weight Dialog Annotator', 'am': 'light-weight Dialogue Annotator', 'az': 'MATILDA - Multi-AnnoTator Multi-language InteractiveLight-weight Dialog Annotator', 'bn': 'MATILDA - Multi- AnnoTator multi- language Interactivelight- weight Dialog Annotator', 'bs': 'MATILDA - Multi-AnnoTator multi-jezički interaktivan lagan dialog Annotator', 'ca': 'MATILDA - Multi-AnnoTator MultilingueLight-weight Dialog Annotator', 'cs': 'MATILDA.Multi-AnnoTator multi-language InteractiveLight-weight Dialogue Annotator', 'et': 'MATILDA - Multi-AnnoTator mitmekeelne interaktiivne Kerge dialoogi annotator', 'fi': 'MATILDA - Multi-AnnoTator monikielinen interaktiivinenLight-weight Dialogue Annotator', 'hy': 'Comment', 'jv': 'MATINDA - Multi-Text', 'ha': "Li- nau'in Dialog Annonator", 'he': 'Name', 'sk': 'MATILDA - Večjezikovni interaktivni večjezikovni večjezikovni večjezikovni komentator', 'bo': 'MATILDA - སྐད་རིགས་སྣ་མང་མཐོང་སྣང་བྱེད་པ་དང་སྒྲ་བརྙན་མཐོང་སྣང་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Dialogue Systems are becoming ubiquitous in various forms and shapes-virtual assistants(Siri, Alexa, etc.), chat-bots, customer sup-port, chit-chat systems just to name a few. The advances in language models and their publication have democratised advanced NLP.However, data remains a crucial bottleneck. Our contribution to this essential pillar isMATILDA, to the best of our knowledge the first multi-annotator, multi-language dialogue annotation tool. MATILDA allows the creation of corpora, the management of users, the annotation of dialogues, the quick adaptation of the user interface to any language and the resolution of inter-annotator disagreement. We evaluate the tool on ease of use, annotation speed and interannotation resolution for both experts and novices and conclude that this tool not only supports the full pipeline for dialogue annotation, but also allows non-technical people to easily use it. We are completely open-sourcing the tool at https://github.com/wluper/matilda and provide a tutorial video1.', 'ar': 'أصبحت أنظمة الحوار موجودة في كل مكان بأشكال وأشكال مختلفة - المساعدون الافتراضيون (سيري ، أليكسا ، إلخ) ، روبوتات الدردشة ، منفذ دعم العملاء ، وأنظمة الدردشة الشيت ، على سبيل المثال لا الحصر. البرمجة اللغوية العصبية المتقدمة بطريقة ديمقراطية ، ومع ذلك ، تظل البيانات تشكل عنق الزجاجة الحاسمة. مساهمتنا في هذا الركيزة الأساسية هي MATILDA ، على حد علمنا ، أول أداة شرح توضيحي للحوار متعدد اللغات. تسمح MATILDA بإنشاء هيئة ، وإدارة المستخدمين ، وتعليق الحوارات ، والتكيف السريع لواجهة المستخدم مع أي لغة وحل الخلاف بين المعلقين. نقوم بتقييم الأداة من حيث سهولة الاستخدام وسرعة التعليقات التوضيحية وحل التعليقات الداخلية لكل من الخبراء والمبتدئين ونخلص إلى أن هذه الأداة لا تدعم فقط خط الأنابيب الكامل لتعليقات الحوار التوضيحية ، ولكنها تتيح أيضًا للأشخاص غير التقنيين استخدامها بسهولة. نحن نفتح المصدر بالكامل للأداة على https://github.com/wluper/matilda ونوفر مقطع فيديو تعليميًا 1.', 'fr': "Les systèmes de dialogue deviennent omniprésents sous diverses formes\xa0: assistants virtuels (Siri, Alexa, etc.), robots de discussion, support client, systèmes de chat pour n'en nommer que ceux-ci.Les progrès des modèles linguistiques et leur publication ont démocratisé le NLP avancé.Cependant, les données restent un goulot d'étranglement crucial. La contribution à ce pilier essentiel est Matilda, à notre connaissance, le premier outil d'annotation de dialogue multi-annotateur et multilingue. MATILDA permet la création de corpus, la gestion des utilisateurs, l'annotation de dialogues, l'adaptation rapide de l'interface utilisateur à n'importe quelle langue et la résolution des désaccords entre les annotateurs. Nous évaluons l'outil en termes de facilité d'utilisation, de vitesse d'annotation et de résolution inter-annotations pour les experts et les novices et concluons que cet outil prend en charge non seulement l'ensemble du pipeline d'annotations de dialogue, mais permet également à des personnes non techniques de l'utiliser facilement. Nous avons complètement ouvert l'outil à l'adresse https://github.com/wluper/matilda et fournissons un tutoriel vidéo1.", 'es': 'Los sistemas de diálogo se están volviendo omnipresentes en varias formas y formas: asistentes virtuales (Siri, Alexa, etc.), bots de chat, soporte al cliente, sistemas de chat, por nombrar algunos. Los avances en los modelos lingüísticos y su publicación han democratizado la PNL avanzada.Sin embargo, los datos siguen siendo un cuello de botella crucial. contribución a este pilar esencial esMatilda, según nuestro leal saber y entender, la primera herramienta de anotación de diálogos multi-anotador y multilingüe. MATILDA permite la creación de corpora, la gestión de usuarios, la anotación de diálogos, la adaptación rápida de la interfaz de usuario a cualquier idioma y la resolución de desacuerdos entre anotadores. Evaluamos la herramienta en cuanto a la facilidad de uso, la velocidad de anotación y la resolución de interanotaciones tanto para expertos como para principiantes y concluimos que esta herramienta no solo admite todo el proceso de anotación de diálogo, sino que también permite que personas sin conocimientos técnicos la usen fácilmente. Estamos completamente en open sourcing de la herramienta en https://github.com/wluper/matilda y ofrecemos un video1 tutorial.', 'pt': 'Os sistemas de diálogo estão se tornando onipresentes em várias formas e formatos - assistentes virtuais (Siri, Alexa, etc.), chat-bots, suporte ao cliente, sistemas de bate-papo, apenas para citar alguns. Os avanços nos modelos de linguagem e sua publicação democratizou a PNL avançada. No entanto, os dados continuam sendo um gargalo crucial. Nossa contribuição para este pilar essencial é MATILDA, até onde sabemos, a primeira ferramenta de anotação de diálogo multi-annotator e multi-idioma. MATILDA permite a criação de corpora, o gerenciamento de usuários, a anotação de diálogos, a rápida adaptação da interface do usuário a qualquer idioma e a resolução de divergências entre anotadores. Avaliamos a ferramenta em facilidade de uso, velocidade de anotação e resolução de interanotação para especialistas e novatos e concluímos que esta ferramenta não apenas suporta todo o pipeline para anotação de diálogo, mas também permite que pessoas não técnicas a usem facilmente. Estamos totalmente de código aberto da ferramenta em https://github.com/wluper/matilda e fornecemos um vídeo tutorial1.', 'ja': 'ダイアログシステムは、バーチャルアシスタント（ Siri、Alexaなど）、チャットボット、カスタマーサプポート、チャットチャットシステムなど、さまざまな形で普及しています。言語モデルの進歩とその出版により、高度なNLPが民主化されました。しかし、データは依然として重要なボトルネックです。この重要な柱への当社の貢献は、私たちの知る限りでは、最初のマルチアノテーター、多言語ダイアログアノテーションツールであるMATILDAです。 MATILDAは、コーポラの作成、ユーザーの管理、対話の注釈付け、ユーザーインターフェースのあらゆる言語への迅速な適応、および注釈者間の意見の不一致の解決を可能にします。 私たちは、専門家と初心者の両方にとっての使いやすさ、注釈スピード、および注釈間の分解能に関するツールを評価し、このツールは対話注釈のための完全なパイプラインをサポートするだけでなく、非技術的な人々が簡単にそれを使用できると結論付けます。 Https://github.com/wluper/matildaでツールを完全にオープンソース化し、チュートリアルビデオを提供しています1。', 'hi': 'संवाद प्रणाली विभिन्न रूपों और आकारों में सर्वव्यापी हो रही है - आभासी सहायक (सिरी, एलेक्सा, आदि), चैट-बॉट्स, ग्राहक सुप-पोर्ट, चिट-चैट सिस्टम बस कुछ नाम देने के लिए। भाषा मॉडल और उनके प्रकाशन में प्रगति ने उन्नत एनएलपी का लोकतंत्रीकरण किया है। हालांकि, डेटा एक महत्वपूर्ण बाधा बनी हुई है। इस आवश्यक स्तंभ के लिए हमारा योगदान isMATILDA, हमारे ज्ञान का सबसे अच्छा करने के लिए पहले बहु annotator, बहु भाषा संवाद एनोटेशन उपकरण. MATILDA कॉर्पोरेट के निर्माण, उपयोगकर्ताओं के प्रबंधन, संवादों के एनोटेशन, किसी भी भाषा के लिए उपयोगकर्ता इंटरफ़ेस के त्वरित अनुकूलन और अंतर-एनोटेटर असहमति के समाधान की अनुमति देता है। हम विशेषज्ञों और नौसिखियों दोनों के लिए उपयोग में आसानी, एनोटेशन गति और इंटरएननोटेशन रिज़ॉल्यूशन पर उपकरण का मूल्यांकन करते हैं और निष्कर्ष निकालते हैं कि यह उपकरण न केवल संवाद एनोटेशन के लिए पूर्ण पाइपलाइन का समर्थन करता है, बल्कि गैर-तकनीकी लोगों को आसानी से इसका उपयोग करने की अनुमति देता है। हम पूरी तरह से खुले हैं-https://github.com/wluper/matilda पर उपकरण सोर्सिंग और एक ट्यूटोरियल video1 प्रदान करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Диалоговые системы становятся повсеместными в различных формах и формах - виртуальные ассистенты(Siri, Alexa и т. д.), чат-боты, клиентский суппорт, чат-чат-системы, просто чтобы назвать несколько. Достижения в языковых моделях и их публикация демократизировали продвинутый NLP. Тем не менее, данные остаются решающим узким местом. Наш вклад в этот важный столп - Matilda, насколько нам известно, первый мульти-нотатор, мульти-языковой инструмент для аннотации диалога. MATILDA позволяет создавать корпорации, управлять пользователями, аннотировать диалоги, быстро адаптировать пользовательский интерфейс к любому языку и разрешать разногласия между аннотаторами. Мы оцениваем инструмент по простоте использования, скорости аннотации и разрешению между аннотациями как для экспертов, так и для новичков и делаем вывод, что этот инструмент не только поддерживает полный конвейер для аннотации диалога, но и позволяет нетехническим людям легко использовать его. Мы полностью открываем доступ к инструменту по адресу https://github.com/wluper/matilda и предоставляем обучающее видео1.', 'zh': '对话系统正以文物变化无不在 - 虚拟助手(Siri,Alexa等),聊天机器人,客户支端口,闲话系统仅举几例。 言语进步及出版使先进NLP民主化。 然数犹一机之瓶颈也。 我们对这一重支柱的贡献是MATILDA,据我们所知,这是第一多注释器,多言语对话注释具。 MATILDA许创造语料库,管理用户,注释对语,将用户界面速调整为一切语言及解注者之分歧。 吾评其易用性,注速与新手交注分辨率,并得其说,非特全管也,又许非技术人员轻用之。 https://github.com/wluper/matilda 尽开源具,以供教程视频1。', 'ga': 'Tá Córais Idirphlé ag éirí uileláithreach i bhfoirmeacha agus i gcruthanna éagsúla - cúntóirí fíorúla (Siri, Alexa, etc.), comhrá-róbónna, tacaíocht do chustaiméirí, córais chit-chat gan ach roinnt a lua. NLP chun cinn daonlathaithe. Mar sin féin, tá sonraí fós ina n-scrogall ríthábhachtach.Is é an rannchuidiú atá againn leis an gcolún riachtanach seo náMATILDA, chomh fada agus is eol dúinn an chéad uirlis nótaí dialóige il-anótóra, ilteangacha. Ceadaíonn MATILDA corpora a chruthú, úsáideoirí a bhainistiú, anótáil idirphlé, an comhéadan úsáideora a oiriúnú go tapa chuig teanga ar bith agus réiteach easaontais idir anótairí. Déanaimid measúnú ar an uirlis maidir le héascaíocht úsáide, luas anótála agus réiteach idirnótaí do shaineolaithe agus do thosaitheoirí araon agus déanaimid an tátal go dtacaíonn an uirlis seo ní hamháin leis an bpíblíne iomlán le haghaidh anótáil idirphlé, ach ligeann sé do dhaoine neamhtheicniúla é a úsáid go héasca. Tá an uirlis oscailte go hiomlán againn ag https://github.com/wluper/matilda agus cuirimid físeán teagaisc ar fáil1.', 'hu': 'A párbeszédrendszerek különböző formákban és formákban mindenütt jelen vannak - virtuális asszisztensek (Siri, Alexa, stb.), chat-botok, ügyfélszolgálati portok, chit-chat rendszerek csak hogy néhányat említsek. A nyelvi modellek fejlődése és kiadványai demokratizálták a fejlett NLP-t. Az adatok azonban továbbra is döntő szűk keresztmetszetet jelentenek. Ehhez az alapvető pillérhez való hozzájárulásunk a MATILDA, tudásunk szerint az első többnyelvű, többnyelvű párbeszédjegyzék eszköz. A MATILDA lehetővé teszi a korpuszok létrehozását, a felhasználók kezelését, a párbeszédek jegyzetelését, a felhasználói felület gyors adaptálását bármilyen nyelvhez, valamint a kommentátorok közötti nézeteltérés megoldását. Értékeljük az eszközt a könnyű használatra, a jegyzetelési sebességre és az interjegyzési felbontásra vonatkozóan mind a szakértők, mind a kezdők számára, és arra a következtetésre jutunk, hogy ez az eszköz nem csak a párbeszédjegyzések teljes csatornáját támogatja, hanem lehetővé teszi a nem technikai emberek számára, hogy könnyen használják azt. Teljesen nyílt forráskódú eszközt biztosítunk a https://github.com/wluper/matilda és bemutató videót nyújtana1.', 'el': 'Τα συστήματα διαλόγου γίνονται πανταχού παρόντα σε διάφορες μορφές και σχήματα: εικονικοί βοηθοί (κ.λπ.), chat-bots, υποστήριξη πελατών, συστήματα chit-chat για να αναφέρουμε μόνο μερικά. Οι πρόοδοι στα γλωσσικά μοντέλα και η δημοσίευσή τους έχουν εκδημοκρατίσει το προηγμένο NLP. Ωστόσο, τα δεδομένα εξακολουθούν να αποτελούν κρίσιμο εμπόδιο. Η συμβολή μας σε αυτόν τον ουσιαστικό πυλώνα είναι το πρώτο εργαλείο σχολιασμού πολυγλωσσικού διαλόγου. Η MATILDA επιτρέπει τη δημιουργία σωμάτων, τη διαχείριση των χρηστών, την σχολιασμό των διαλόγων, τη γρήγορη προσαρμογή της διεπαφής χρήστη σε οποιαδήποτε γλώσσα και την επίλυση διαφωνίας μεταξύ σχολιαστών. Αξιολογούμε το εργαλείο σχετικά με την ευκολία χρήσης, την ταχύτητα σχολιασμού και την ανάλυση διαλογής τόσο για ειδικούς όσο και για αρχάριους και καταλήγουμε στο συμπέρασμα ότι αυτό το εργαλείο όχι μόνο υποστηρίζει τον πλήρη αγωγό σχολιασμού διαλόγου, αλλά επίσης επιτρέπει στους μη τεχνικούς ανθρώπους να το χρησιμοποιούν εύκολα. Είμαστε εντελώς ανοικτές προμήθειες του εργαλείου στο https://github.com/wluper/matilda και να παρέχει ένα βίντεο εκμάθησης1.', 'ka': 'დიალოგის სისტემები განსხვავებული ფორმებში და ფორმებში გახდება - ვირტუალური asistents ენების მოდელების წინასწარმატებით და მათი პუბუკრატიაციას დემოკრატიზებული NLP. მაგრამ, მონაცემები უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი ბრძანებია. ჩვენი დამატება ამ მნიშვნელოვანი კოლმარისთვის არის MATILDA, ჩვენი უკეთესი მეცნიერებაში პირველი მნიშვნელოვანი, მნიშვნელოვანი დიალოგის ანოტაციის ხელსაწყოთან. MATILDA შესაძლებელია corpora- ის შექმნა, მომხმარებლის მენეჯერება, დიალოგიების მონიშნობა, მომხმარებლის ინტერფექტის ბრძელი აკაპექტირება ყველა ენაში და ინტერფექტის განსხვავებ ჩვენ გამოყენება სიმართლე, ანტოციის სიმართლე და ინტენოტაციის რეზიოციაციას ექსპერტებისთვის და ნონოტაციისთვის გავამუშავებთ და დავაკეთებთ, რომ ეს ხელსაწყოფილი არა მხოლოდ მხოლოდ დიალოგის ანტო ჩვენ ყველაფერად გახსნა ხელსაწყოთან https://github.com/wluper/matilda და დააკეთება სტუტიური ვიდეო1.', 'it': "I sistemi di dialogo stanno diventando onnipresenti in varie forme e forme: assistenti virtuali (Siri, Alexa, ecc.), chat-bot, supporto clienti, sistemi di chat chat solo per citarne alcuni. I progressi nei modelli linguistici e la loro pubblicazione hanno democratizzato il PNL avanzato. Tuttavia, i dati rimangono un ostacolo cruciale. Il nostro contributo a questo pilastro essenziale è MATILDA, il primo strumento di annotazione multi-annotatore e multilingue del dialogo. MATILDA permette la creazione di corpora, la gestione degli utenti, l'annotazione dei dialoghi, il rapido adattamento dell'interfaccia utente a qualsiasi linguaggio e la risoluzione del disaccordo tra gli annotatori. Valutiamo lo strumento sulla facilità d'uso, sulla velocità di annotazione e sulla risoluzione delle annotazioni sia per esperti che per principianti e concludiamo che questo strumento non solo supporta l'intera pipeline per l'annotazione dei dialoghi, ma consente anche a persone non tecniche di utilizzarlo facilmente. Siamo completamente open-sourcing lo strumento a https://github.com/wluper/matilda e fornire un video tutorial.1", 'kk': 'Диалог жүйелері түрлі пішінде және пішінде көмекшілер (Siri, Alexa, т. б.), шат- боттары, клиенттердің суп- порты, шат- шат жүйелері бірнеше атау үшін көмекшілер болып жатыр. Тіл үлгілерінде және басып шығаруларының бағдарламалары демократизацияланған NLP. Бірақ мәліметтер маңызды жерде қалды. Бұл негізгі бағдарламаға қатынасыз - MATILDA, бірінші біліміздің ең жақсы білімізге бірнеше көп белгілер, көп тілді диалог белгілеу құралы. MATILDA корпора, пайдаланушыларды басқаруға, диалогтарды басқаруға, пайдаланушының интерфейсінің тез адаптациясын кез келген тіліне және белгілердің айырмашылығын құруға мүмкіндік береді. Біз пайдалану, жаңалықтардың жылдамдығын және жаңалықтардың көмекшілігін жасау құралын бағалаймыз. Бұл құралы тек диалог жаңалықтарының толығын қолдауға мүмкіндік бермейді, сондай-ақ техникалық емес адамдарды Біз бұл құралды толық ашып, https://github.com/wluper/matilda және оқушылық 1 видеоны келтіріңіз.', 'ml': 'വ്യത്യസ്ത രൂപത്തിലും രൂപത്തിലും ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റമില്ലാത്ത സംവിധാനങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത രൂപത്തിലുമായി മാറുന്നു. വാര്\u200dച്ച്വല്\u200d സഹായികള്\u200d (സിരി, അലെക്സാ, എക്സ് ഭാഷയിലെ മോഡലുകളിലെ മുന്നേറുന്നതും അവരുടെ പ്രസംഗിക്കുന്നതും മുന്നേറുന്ന NLP പ്രസംഗിക്കുന്നു. എന്നാലും, വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ബോട്ട്ലെന്\u200dക് ആയിരിക്കും. ഈ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സ്തംഭത്തിലേക്ക് ഞങ്ങളുടെ പങ്ക് നമ്മുടെ ആദ്യത്തെ അഭിപ്രായശ്ചിത്രത്തിലേക്ക് ഏറ്റവും നല്ല അറിവിലേക്കാണ MATILDA ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ നിര്\u200dമ്മാണം, ഡയലോഗുകളുടെ നിര്\u200dമ്മാണം, ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ഇന്റര്\u200dമെസ്റ്റിന്റെ വേഗത്തിലേക്കുള്ള വ്യത്യാസവും വ്യത്യാസവി വിശേഷികള്\u200dക്കും നോവിക്കുകള്\u200dക്കും ഉപയോഗിക്കാനുള്ള വേഗത്തിലും, വേഗത്തിലുള്ള വിശദീകരണത്തിനും ഉപയോഗിക്കാനുള്ള ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d എളുപ്പമാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിലയിച്ചു തരുന നമ്മള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും തുറന്നുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു https://github.com/wluper/matilda എന്നിട്ട് വിഡിയോയോ 1 കൊടുക്കുക.', 'mk': 'Системите за дијалог стануваат насекаде во различни форми и форми - виртуелни асистенти (Сири, Алекса итн.), chat-bots, клиентска поддршка, chat-chat системи само за да се наведат неколку. Напредокот во јазичките модели и нивната објава го демократизираа напредниот НЛП. Сепак, податоците остануваат клучна пречка. Нашиот придонес за овој основен столб е MATILDA, за најдобро од нашето знаење првата алатка за анотација на мултијазичкиот дијалог. MATILDA овозможува создавање на корпора, менаџмент на корисниците, анотација на дијалози, брза адаптација на корисничкиот интерфејс на било кој јазик и решавање на несогласувањето меѓу анотаторите. We evaluate the tool on ease of use, annotation speed and interannotation resolution for both experts and novices and conclude that this tool not only supports the full pipeline for dialogue annotation, but also allows non-technical people to easily use it.  Целосно ја искористуваме алатката https://github.com/wluper/matilda 1.', 'lt': 'Dialogo sistemos tampa visur įvairiomis formomis ir formomis - virtual ūs padėjėjai (Siri, Alexa ir t. t.), pokalbių robotai, klientų palaikymas, pokalbių sistemos tik tam tikrais pavadinimais. The advances in language models and their publication have democratised advanced NLP. Tačiau duomenys tebėra esminis kliūtis. Mūsų indėlis į šį esminį ramstį yra MATILDA, kuo geriau žinome, pirmoji daugiakalbio dialogo annotacijos priemonė. MATILDA allows the creation of corpora, the management of users, the annotation of dialogues, the quick adaptation of the user interface to any language and the resolution of inter-annotator disagreement.  Vertiname priemonę, susijusią su lengvu naudojimu, anotacijos greičiu ir tarpanotacijos rezoliucija tiek ekspertams, tiek pradedantiesiems ir darome išvadą, kad ši priemonė ne tik remia visą dialogo anotacijos vamzdyną, bet ir leidžia netechniniams žmonėms lengvai ją naudoti. Mes visiškai naudojame šią priemonę https://github.com/wluper/matilda ) ir pateikti mokymo vaizdo įrašą1.', 'mn': 'Диалог системүүд олон хэлбэрүүд болон хэлбэрүүд байдаг. Виртуал тусламжууд. Холын загварын хөгжлийн хөгжлийн болон түүний хэвлэл нь улам хөгжлийн НLP-г ардчилсан. Гэвч мэдээлэл нь чухал хэмжээнд үлдсэн. Энэ чухал хэлбэрт бидний нөлөөлөл нь МАТИЛДА, бидний мэдлэгтэй хамгийн сайн мэдлэгтэй, олон хэлний диалогын анзаарах хэрэгсэл. MATILDA нь корпора, хэрэглэгчийн удирдах, диалогын захирах, хэрэглэгчийн интерфейсийн хурдан захирах боломжтой болгодог. Хэрэглэгчийн интерфейсийг хэлний хэл дээр хурдан захирах боломжтой. Бид хэрэглээ амархан, анзаарах хурд болон шийдвэрлэлийн шийдвэрлэлийг үнэлдэг. Энэ хэрэгсэл нь зөвхөн диалог дээрх бүрэн хоолойнуудыг дэмжих биш, мөн техник бус хүмүүст амархан ашиглах боломжтой болгоно. Бид маш нээлттэй хэрэгслийг https://github.com/wluper/matilda сургалтын бичлэг 1 гаргадаг.', 'no': 'Dialogsystemet blir svært omvendt i ulike formar og formar – virtuelt assistent (Siri, Alexa osv.), pratebots, klientsupport, chit-pratesystemet for å bare namna nokre. Avanseringane i språk-modeller og publikasjonen har demokratisert avansert NLP. Data er imidlertid eit viktig botnekk. Bidraget vårt til denne viktige pillaren er MATILDA, til den beste vitninga vårt, det første mellommerkingsverktøyet for merkingsverktøyet for fleirspråk. MATILDA tillèt opprettinga av korpora, handtering av brukarar, annotasjonen av dialogar, snøggtilpassing av brukargrensesnittet til kvar språk og oppløysing av avtaler. Vi evaluerer verktøyet for enkelt bruk, notasjonsfart og internotasjonsoppløysing for både ekspertar og nytt, og avsluttar at dette verktøyet ikkje berre støttar fullstendig røyr for dialogannotasjon, men også lèt ikkje-tekniske menneske å bruka det enkelt. Vi er fullstendig opna-kjeldeverktøyet på https://github.com/wluper/matilda og oppgje eit utdanning av video1.', 'mt': 'Is-Sistemi ta’ Djalogu qegħdin isiru kullimkien f’forom u forom varji – assistenti virtwali (Siri, Alexa, eċċ.), chat-bots, appoġġ għall-klijenti, chit-chat systems biss biex jisimgħu ftit. L-avvanzi fil-mudelli lingwistiċi u l-pubblikazzjoni tagħhom iddemokratizzaw NLP avvanzat. Madankollu, id-dejta tibqa’ ostaklu kruċjali. Il-kontribut tagħna għal dan il-pilastru essenzjali huwa MATILDA, għall-aħjar għarfien tagħna l-ewwel għodda ta’ annotazzjoni ta’ djalogu b’diversi annotaturi u lingwi. MATILDA tippermetti l-ħolqien ta’ korpra, il-ġestjoni tal-utenti, l-annotazzjoni tad-djalogi, l-adattament rapidu tal-interfaċċja tal-utent għal kwalunkwe lingwa u r-riżoluzzjoni ta’ nuqqas ta’ qbil bejn l-annotaturi. Aħna nivvalutaw l-għodda dwar il-faċilità tal-użu, il-veloċit à tal-annotazzjoni u r-riżoluzzjoni tal-interannotazzjoni kemm għall-esperti kif ukoll għall-bdiewa u nikkonkludu li din l-għodda mhux biss tappoġġja l-pipeline sħiħ għall-annotazzjoni tad-djalogu, iżda tippermetti wkoll lin-nies mhux tekniċi jużawha faċilment. We are completely open-sourcing the tool at  https://github.com/wluper/matilda ) u jipprovdu vidjow tutorjali1.', 'ro': 'Sistemele de dialog devin omniprezente în diferite forme și forme - asistenți virtuali (Siri, Alexa, etc.), chat-bots, suport client, sisteme chit-chat doar pentru a numi câteva. Avansarea modelelor lingvistice și publicarea acestora au democratizat PNL avansat. Cu toate acestea, datele rămân un blocaj crucial. Contribuţia noastră la acest pilon esenţial este MATILDA, primul instrument de adnotare multilingvistică a dialogului. MATILDA permite crearea de corpore, gestionarea utilizatorilor, adnotarea dialogurilor, adaptarea rapidă a interfeței cu utilizatorul la orice limbă și rezolvarea dezacordului inter-adnotator. Evaluăm instrumentul privind ușurința de utilizare, viteza adnotării și rezoluția interadnotării atât pentru experți, cât și pentru începători și concluzionăm că acest instrument nu numai că suportă toată conducta pentru adnotarea dialogurilor, ci permite și persoanelor non-tehnice să o folosească cu ușurință. Suntem complet open-source instrumentul la https://github.com/wluper/matilda și oferă un videoclip tutorial.1', 'pl': 'Systemy dialogowe stają się wszechobecne w różnych formach i kształtach: wirtualnych asystentów (Siri, Alexa itp.), chatbotów, obsługi klienta, systemów chit-czatu, żeby wymienić tylko kilka. Postępy w modelach językowych i ich publikacji zdemokratyzowały zaawansowane NLP. Dane pozostają jednak kluczowym wąskim gardłem. Naszym wkładem w ten podstawowy filar jest MATILDA, pierwsze wielojęzyczne narzędzie do adnotacji dialogu. MATILDA umożliwia tworzenie korpusów, zarządzanie użytkownikami, adnotację dialogów, szybką adaptację interfejsu użytkownika do dowolnego języka oraz rozwiązywanie niezgodności między adnotatorami. Oceniamy narzędzie pod kątem łatwości użytkowania, szybkości adnotacji i rozdzielczości interadnotacji zarówno dla ekspertów, jak i początkujących i stwierdzamy, że narzędzie to nie tylko obsługuje pełny rurociąg adnotacji dialogowej, ale także pozwala osobom nietechnicznym na łatwe korzystanie z niego. Jesteśmy całkowicie open-sourcing narzędzia w https://github.com/wluper/matilda i dostarczyć samouczek wideo1.', 'ms': 'Sistem Dialog semakin luas dalam berbagai bentuk dan bentuk - pembantu maya (Siri, Alexa, dll.), chat-bot, suport pelanggan, sistem chat-hanya untuk nama beberapa. Kemajuan dalam model bahasa dan penerbitan mereka telah demokrasi NLP maju. Bagaimanapun, data kekal pengendalian penting. Kontribusi kami kepada pilar penting ini adalah MATILDA, untuk pengetahuan terbaik kami alat annotasi dialog berbilang bahasa pertama. MATILDA allows the creation of corpora, the management of users, the annotation of dialogues, the quick adaptation of the user interface to any language and the resolution of inter-annotator disagreement.  Kami menilai alat untuk mudah digunakan, kelajuan anotasi dan resolusi interannotasi untuk ahli dan pemula dan kesimpulan bahawa alat ini tidak hanya menyokong saluran paip penuh untuk anotasi dialog, tetapi juga membolehkan orang-orang bukan teknikal untuk menggunakannya dengan mudah. Kami benar-benar membuka sumber alat di https://github.com/wluper/matilda  and provide a tutorial video1.', 'si': 'සංවාදය පද්ධතිය සංවාදය විවිධ ප්\u200dරවිධානය සහ හැකියාවක් වලින් ප්\u200dරවිධානය වෙනවා - අවස්ථාවිත සහායකයෝ (සිරි, ඇලෙක්සා, ඉතින්.), ක භාෂා මෝඩේල් වල ප්\u200dරධානය සහ ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරකාශනය නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙනවා. ඒත් දත්ත තියෙන්නේ වැදගත් බෝට්ලන්ගෙන් ඉන්නවා. අපි මේ අවශ්\u200dය ස්තූතියෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ මෙයා MATILDA, අපේ දන්නවත් හොඳම දන්නවට, පළමුවෙන් විශිෂ්ට විශිෂ්ට ව MATILDA අවශ්\u200dය කර්පෝරා, ප්\u200dරයෝජකයේ පාලනය, සංවාදයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය, ප්\u200dරයෝජකයේ සංවාදයේ ඉක්මනින් සංවේදනය සහ කිසිම භාෂා අපි පාවිච්චි වෙනුවෙන් පරීක්ෂණය, නෝටේෂන් වේගය සහ අන්තර්ජනය විශ්වාසය සහ අන්තර්ජනය විශ්වාසය සඳහා මේ උපකරණය සම්පූර්ණ පායිප්ලි අපි සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම විවෘත කරන්නේ උපකරණය https://github.com/wluper/matilda ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරධාන විඩියෝපයක් දෙන්න.', 'so': 'Siri, Alexa, etc.), chat-bots, boortiga macaamiisha, nidaamka chat-chat-boostada, si ay u magacaabaan wax yar. Horumarinta qaababka luuqada iyo baaritaankooda ayaa horumariyey NLP. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, macluumaadku waxay sii jiraan baalal muhiim ah. Midhahayaga ugu qayb gala tiirkan muhiimka ah isMATILDA, tan ugu fiican aqoontayada ee ugu horeeya daryeelka dialogue-ka kala duduwan ee luuqadaha kala duduwan. MATILDA wuxuu fasaxaa abuuridda shirkadda, maamulka isticmaalayaasha, baaritaanka dialogueyda, isbedelka isticmaaluhu si degdeg ah ugu beddelo luqad kasta iyo go’aanka iskala xiriirka. Waxaannu qiimeynaynaa qalabka fudud isticmaalka, sahliga isticmaalka iyo xafiiska dalbashada ee labada 专门iga iyo dadka noocyada ah, waxaynu ku qiimeynaynaa inuusan kaalmeyn qoraalkan oo kaliya, laakiin waxaa sidoo kale ku sahlan in qofka aan isticmaalin si fudud. waxaan si kamid ah u furan nahay qalabka https://github.com/wluper/matilda Fiidiyow waxbarasho 1.', 'sr': 'Sistemi dijaloga postaju svuda u raznim oblicima i oblicima - virtualni asistenti (Siri, Alexa, itd.), chat-boti, sup-port kupaca, chat-chat sistemi samo da bi nazvali nekoliko. Napredak jezičkih modela i njihova publikacija demokratizirao je napredni NLP. Međutim, podaci ostaju ključni vrat. Naš doprinos ovom osnovnom stupnju je MATILDA, na najbolje od našeg znanja, prvi multi-annotatorski, multi-jezički instrument za annotaciju dijaloga. MATILDA omogućava stvaranje korpore, upravljanje korisnicima, annotaciju dijaloga, brzu adaptaciju korisničkog interfejsa bilo kojem jeziku i rješavanje neslaganja međuannotatora. Procjenjujemo alat za lakšu upotrebu, brzinu annotacije i rezoluciju interannotacije ekspertima i novinama i zaključujemo da ovaj alat ne samo podržava punu cijevinu za annotaciju dijaloga, nego takođe omogućava da ga nekotehnički ljudi lako koriste. Potpuno otvaramo alat u https://github.com/wluper/matilda I pružite nastavni video 1.', 'ta': 'உரையாடல் அமைப்பு மொழி மாதிரிகளின் முன்னேற்றம் மற்றும் அவர்களுடைய வெளிப்பாடு NLP மேம்பட்டுள்ளது. ஆனால், தரவு முக்கியமான குடிப்புக்குள் இருக்கிறது. Our contribution to this essential pillar isMATILDA, to the best of our knowledge the first multi-annotator, multi-language dialogue annotation tool.  MATILDA நிறுவனத்தை உருவாக்க அனுமதிக்கும், பயனர் நிர்வாகி, உரையாடல் விளக்கம், எந்த மொழியின் விரைவான ஒதுக்கும் பயனர் இடைமுகத்தின் வித்தியாசம் மற்றும நாம் பயன்படுத்தல், அறிவிப்பு வேகம் மற்றும் புதிய தெளிவுத்திறனை எளிதாக்கும் கருவியை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் இந்த கருவி உரையாடல் விளக்கத்திற்கு மட்டும் ம நாங்கள் முழுமையாக திறந்த கருவியில் https://github.com/wluper/matilda புதிய வீடியோ1 வழங்குகிறது.', 'sv': 'Dialogsystem blir allestädes närvarande i olika former och former - virtuella assistenter (Siri, Alexa, etc.), chattrobotar, kundsupport, chit-chattsystem bara för att nämna några. Framstegen när det gäller språkmodeller och deras publicering har demokratiserat avancerad nationell politik. Uppgifterna är dock fortfarande en avgörande flaskhals. Vårt bidrag till denna viktiga pelare är MATILDA, så vitt vi vet det första flerspråkiga kommentatorverktyget för dialog. MATILDA möjliggör skapande av corpora, hantering av användare, notering av dialoger, snabb anpassning av användargränssnittet till alla språk och lösning av inter-annotator oenighet. Vi utvärderar verktyget på användarvänlighet, kommenteringshastighet och interannotationsupplösning för både experter och nybörjare och drar slutsatsen att detta verktyg inte bara stöder hela pipeline för dialoganteckningar, utan också tillåter icke-tekniska personer att enkelt använda det. Vi är helt öppna-sourcing verktyget på https://github.com/wluper/matilda och tillhandahålla en handledningsvideo1.', 'ur': 'Dialog Systems are becoming ubiquitous in various forms and shapes - virtual assistants (Siri, Alexa, etc.), chat-bots, customer sup-port, chit-chat systems just to name a few. زبان مدلکوں اور ان کی جماعت کی پیشرفت ان کی پیشرفت نے اضافہ NLP کی ہے۔ اگرچہ، ڈیٹا ایک ضروری بٹولگرد ہے۔ ہمارا حصہ اس ضروری ستونر میں ہے ماتیلیڈا، ہمارے سب سے بہترین علم میں، پہلے بہت سے اظہار کرنے والے، بہت سی زبان کی گفتگو کا اظہار ابزار ہے. MATILDA کورورا کی پیدا کرنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے، کارساز کی مدیریت، ڈالگوں کی نوشنی، کارساز کی سریع تدبیر کی کوروں کی زبان اور بین نوشنگروں کی مخالفت کی روشنی. ہم نے استعمال کے آسان، آسانی سرعت اور انٹرنوٹ کی روشنی کے ذریعے ابزار کا ارزش کرتا ہے، اور نتیجہ دیتے ہیں کہ یہ ابزار صرف پورا پائٹ لین کو ڈالیٹ انٹرنوٹ کے لئے مدد نہیں کرتا، بلکہ اس سے آسان استعمال کرنے کے لئے غیر تکنیکی لوگوں کو بھی اجازت ہم اس ابزار کو کامل کھولتے ہیں https://github.com/wluper/matilda اور ایک تحصیل ویڈیو ۱ کے لئے۔', 'uz': "Dialog tizimlari turli shakllar va shakllardan bir xil yordamchilar (Siri, Alexa, etc.), chat bots, customer sup-porti, chat-chat tizimi faqat bir nechta nom bo'lishi mumkin. Tilning modellarining taʼminlovlari va nashriyotlari NLP dasturlarini koʻpaytirishdi. Lekin, maʼlumot muhim baytlarda keladi. Bizning eng muhim isMATILDA asosida, bizning birinchi ko'plab-ko'plab muloqat muloqat muloqat muloqat muloqat muloqat taʼminlovchi asbobi bilan eng yaxshi o'rganimiz. Name Biz oddiy ekspert va noviclar uchun foydalanuvchi, taʼminlovchi tezlik va internasiyatlarning qiymatini qiymatimiz va bu asboblar faqat muloqat taʼminlovchisini qoʻllamaydi, balki teknologiya oddiy insonlarni ishlatishga ruxsat beradi. Biz butunlay asboblar https://github.com/wluper/matilda  and provide a tutorial video1.", 'vi': 'Các hệ thống đối thoại luôn hiện hữu trong nhiều dạng và hình dạng khác nhau... các trợ lý ảo (Siri, Alexa, vân vân vân), chat-bot, khách hàng sup port, chit-chat hệ thống chỉ để chỉ nêu vài tên. Sự tiến bộ trong các mô hình ngôn ngữ và xuất bản của chúng đã dân chủ lập lập lập trình. Tuy nhiên, dữ liệu vẫn là nguyên tắc nghẽn. Sự đóng góp của chúng ta cho trụ chính này là MAILDA, theo hiểu biết của chúng ta, công cụ ghi chú đa ngôn ngữ thứ nhất. MAILDA cho phép tạo ra "vật thể", quản lý người dùng, ghi chú ca thoại, một sự thay đổi nhanh chóng của giao diện người dùng thành bất cứ ngôn ngữ nào, và giải quyết bất đồng liên quan. Chúng tôi đánh giá công cụ về độ dễ sử dụng, tốc độ ghi chú và giải quyết bác sĩ ghi chú cho cả chuyên gia và người mới, và kết luận rằng công cụ này không chỉ hỗ trợ các đường ống đầy đủ để ghi chú đối thoại, mà còn cho phép người không kỹ thuật sử dụng nó dễ dàng. Chúng tôi hoàn toàn mở nguồn công cụ tại https://github.com/wluper/matilda và cung cấp một câu tập ảnh', 'nl': "Dialogsystemen worden alomtegenwoordig in verschillende vormen en vormen, zoals virtuele assistenten (Siri, Alexa, enz.), chat-bots, klantenondersteuning, chit-chat systemen om er maar een paar te noemen. De vooruitgang in taalmodellen en hun publicatie hebben geavanceerde NLP democratiseerd. Gegevens blijven echter een cruciale knelpunt. Onze bijdrage aan deze essentiële pijler is MATILDA, naar beste weten de eerste multi-annotator, multi-language dialoog annotatie tool. MATILDA maakt het mogelijk om corpora's te maken, gebruikers te beheren, dialogen te annoteren, de gebruikersinterface snel aan te passen aan elke taal en het oplossen van meningsverschillen tussen annotatoren. We evalueren de tool op gebruiksgemak, annotatiesnelheid en interannotatieresolutie voor zowel experts als beginners en concluderen dat deze tool niet alleen de volledige pijplijn voor dialoogannotatie ondersteunt, maar ook niet-technische mensen in staat stelt om het gemakkelijk te gebruiken. We zijn volledig open-sourcing van de tool bij https://github.com/wluper/matilda en een tutorial video1.", 'da': 'Dialogsystemer bliver allestedsnærværende i forskellige former - virtuelle assistenter (Siri, Alexa osv.), chat-bots, kundesupport, chit-chat systemer bare for at nævne nogle få. Fremskridtene inden for sprogmodeller og deres offentliggørelse har demokratiseret avanceret NLP. Data er dog fortsat en afgørende flaskehalse. Vores bidrag til denne væsentlige søjle er MATILDA, så vidt vi ved det første multi-annotator, flersprogede dialogannoteringsværktøj. MATILDA giver mulighed for oprettelse af corpora, administration af brugere, notering af dialoger, hurtig tilpasning af brugergrænsefladen til ethvert sprog og løsning af inter-annotator uenighed. Vi evaluerer værktøjet på brugervenlighed, annoteringshastighed og interannoteringsopløsning for både eksperter og nybegyndere og konkluderer, at dette værktøj ikke kun understøtter den fulde pipeline til dialog annotering, men også giver ikke-tekniske personer mulighed for nemt at bruge det. Vi er fuldstændig open-sourcing af værktøjet på https://github.com/wluper/matilda og give en vejledningsvideo1.', 'de': 'Dialogsysteme werden in verschiedenen Formen allgegenwärtig: virtuelle Assistenten (Siri, Alexa, etc.), Chat-Bots, Kundensupport, Chit-Chat-Systeme, um nur einige zu nennen. Die Fortschritte bei Sprachmodellen und deren Veröffentlichung haben fortgeschrittene NLP demokratisiert. Allerdings bleiben Daten ein entscheidender Engpass. Unser Beitrag zu dieser wesentlichen Säule ist MATILDA, nach bestem Wissen das erste multi-annotator, mehrsprachige Dialog Annotation Tool. MATILDA ermöglicht die Erstellung von Korpora, die Verwaltung von Benutzern, die Annotation von Dialogen, die schnelle Anpassung der Benutzeroberfläche an jede Sprache und die Lösung von Inter-Annotator-Unstimmigkeiten. Wir bewerten das Tool hinsichtlich Benutzerfreundlichkeit, Annotationsgeschwindigkeit und Interannotationsauflösung sowohl für Experten als auch für Anfänger und kommen zu dem Schluss, dass dieses Tool nicht nur die gesamte Pipeline für Dialogannotation unterstützt, sondern es auch nicht-technischen Personen ermöglicht, es einfach zu verwenden. Wir sind komplett Open-Sourcing des Tools bei https://github.com/wluper/matilda und ein Tutorial-Video1.', 'id': 'Sistem Dialog semakin luas dalam berbagai bentuk dan bentuk - asisten virtual (Siri, Alexa, dll.), chat-bot, suport pelanggan, chat-sistem hanya untuk menamakan beberapa. Kemajuan dalam model bahasa dan publikasi mereka telah demokrasi NLP maju. Namun, data tetap terhalang penting. Kontribusi kami ke pilar penting ini adalah MATILDA, untuk pengetahuan terbaik kami alat annotasi dialog multi-bahasa, multi-annotasi pertama. MATILDA memungkinkan penciptaan corpora, manajemen pengguna, anotasi dialog, penyesuaian cepat antarmuka pengguna ke bahasa apapun dan penyelesaian ketidaksetujuan antar-annotator. Kami mengevaluasi alat untuk mudah digunakan, kecepatan anotasi dan resolusi interannotasi untuk para ahli dan para pemula dan menyimpulkan bahwa alat ini tidak hanya mendukung pipa lengkap untuk anotasi dialog, tetapi juga memungkinkan orang-orang bukan teknis untuk mudah menggunakannya. Kami benar-benar membuka sumber alat di https://github.com/wluper/matilda Dan menyediakan video tutorial1.', 'bg': 'Диалоговите системи стават повсеместни в различни форми и форми - виртуални асистенти (Сири, Алекса и др.), чат-ботове, поддръжка на клиенти, системи за чат само да назовем няколко. Напредъкът в езиковите модели и публикуването им демократизираха напредналата НЛП. Данните обаче остават решаващо затруднение. Нашият принос към този основен стълб е МАТИЛДА, доколкото знаем, първият мулти-анотатор, многоезичен инструмент за анотация на диалог. МАТИЛДА позволява създаването на корпуси, управлението на потребителите, анотацията на диалози, бързото адаптиране на потребителския интерфейс към всеки език и разрешаването на несъгласие между анотаторите. Ние оценяваме инструмента за лесна употреба, скорост на анотация и резолюция на интеранотация както за експерти, така и за начинаещи и заключаваме, че този инструмент не само поддържа пълния тръбопровод за анотация на диалог, но и позволява на нетехническите хора лесно да го използват. Ние напълно отваряме инструмента в https://github.com/wluper/matilda и да предостави видео урок.', 'hr': 'Sistemi dijaloga postaju svuda u raznim oblicima i oblicima - virtualni asistenti (Siri, Alexa, itd.), chat-boti, sup-port kupaca, chit-chat sistemi samo da bi nazvali nekoliko. Napredak jezičkih modela i njihova publikacija demokratizirao je napredni NLP. Međutim, podaci ostaju ključni sladoled. Naš doprinos ovom temeljnom stupnju je MATILDA, na najbolje od našeg znanja, prvi multi-annotatorski, multi-jezički instrument za annotaciju dijaloga. MATILDA omogućava stvaranje korporacije, upravljanje korisnicima, annotaciju dijalogova, brzu prilagodbu korisničkog interfejsa bilo kojem jeziku i rješavanje neslaganja međuannotatora. Procjenjujemo alat za lakšu upotrebu, brzinu annotacije i rezoluciju interannotacije stručnjaka i novinara i zaključujemo da ovaj alat ne samo podržava punu cijevi za annotaciju dijaloga, nego također omogućava da ga nekotehnički ljudi lako koriste. Potpuno otvaramo alat na https://github.com/wluper/matilda i pružiti nastavni video 1.', 'ko': '대화 시스템은 여러 가지 형식과 형식으로 어디에나 있다. 가상 보조(Siri, Alexa 등), 채팅 로봇, 고객 지원, 채팅 시스템 등이다.언어 모델의 진보와 출판은 고급 NLP를 민주화시켰다.그러나 데이터는 여전히 관건적인 병목이다.이 중요한 기둥에 대한 우리의 공헌은 isMATILDA입니다. 우리가 아는 바에 의하면 이것은 첫 번째 다중 주석기, 다중 언어 대화 주석 도구입니다.MATILDA는 언어 자료 라이브러리를 만들고 사용자를 관리하며 대화를 주석하고 사용자 인터페이스를 신속하게 조정하여 모든 언어에 적응하고 주석자 간의 의견 차이를 해결할 수 있습니다.우리는 이 도구의 용이성, 주석 속도와 주석 간의 해상도를 평가하여 이 도구는 완전한 대화 주석 파이프라인을 지원할 뿐만 아니라 비기술자도 쉽게 사용할 수 있다는 결론을 얻었다.우리는 이 공구를 완전히 공개적으로 구매한다https://github.com/wluper/matilda튜토리얼 비디오 1을 제공합니다.', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa mazungumzo yanakuwa tofauti katika namna mbalimbali na mifumo – wasaidizi wa kiraia (Siri, Alexa, etc.), mazungumzo, wateja sup-port, mifumo ya mazungumzo yanayotaja kwa ajili ya kuwataja wachache tu. Maendeleo ya mifano ya lugha na kuchapishwa kwao yamekuwa ya demokrasia kwa NLP. Hata hivyo, taarifa bado ni chupa muhimu. Mchango wetu kwenye msingi huu wa msingi wa isMATILDA, kwa ufahamu wetu bora zaidi, zana ya kwanza ya mazungumzo ya lugha mbalimbali. MATILDA inaruhusu kuundwa kwa kampuni, utawala wa watumiaji, kutangazwa kwa mazungumzo, kubadilishwa kwa haraka kwa mtumiaji kwa lugha yoyote na suluhisho la kutokubaliana na mtangazaji. Tutathmini zana kwa urahisi wa matumizi, haraka ya kutangaza na suluhisho la kutangaza kwa wataalamu na wasomi na tunahitimisha kwamba kifaa hiki si tu kinaunga mkono pipesi kamili ya mazungumzo, bali pia inaruhusu watu wasio na teknolojia kutumia kwa urahisi. Tunatoa chanzo cha wazi kabisa https://github.com/wluper/matilda  and provide a tutorial video1.', 'fa': 'سیستم\u200cهای گفتگو در شکل\u200cهای مختلف و شکل\u200cهای گوناگون تبدیل می\u200cشوند - دستیاران مجازی (Siri, Alexa, etc.)، bot\u200cهای گفتگو، پایین\u200cپورت مشتری، سیستم\u200cهای گفتگو فقط برای نام چند نفر. پیشرفت های مدل زبانی و منتشر کردن آنها NLP پیشرفت را دموکراتیک ساخته است. ولي داده ها يه گردن بطري مهم باقي مونده کمک ما به این ستون ضروری ماتیلدا است، به بهترین دانش ما ابزار نویسنده\u200cهای متعدد و متعدد زبان صحبت می\u200cکنیم. MATILDA اجازه می\u200cدهد که ایجاد شرکت، مدیریت کاربران، اظهار گفتگوها، تنظیم سریع ارتباط کاربران به هر زبان و راه حل اختلاف بین\u200cآشنا کننده باشد. ما ابزار را بر آسانی از استفاده، سرعت آگاهی و راه حل بین\u200cاندازی برای دانشمندان و نویسندگان ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم و نتیجه می\u200cدهیم که این ابزار نه تنها لوله\u200cهای کامل برای آگاهی مشارکت گفتگو پشتیبانی می\u200cکند، بلکه اجازه می\u200cدهد که مردم غیرفنی از ما ابزار را کاملا باز می کنیم https://github.com/wluper/matilda و یک ویدئو آموزش ۱ را فراهم کنید.', 'tr': "Dialog sistemleri g철rn체힊 힊eklinde we bi챌imlerde hemi힊e bolup otyr - wirtual k철mek챌iler (Siri, Alexa, we.b.), chat-bots, m체힊teriler sup-port, 챌at sistemleri birn채챌e adlamak 체챌in. Dil nusgalarynda we 챌apjylaryny흫 철s체mlikleri NLP d철wleti힊dirildi. Bu 힊ekilde, veri 철r채n m철h체m bo힊luk 챌철pl체ginde gal첵ar. Bizi흫 bu m철h체m s체첵힊imiz MATYLDA, ilkinji multi-t철w체rc체li, multi-dilli dialog du첵첵ark챌ylyklary흫 i흫 gowy bilgimize t채sirlemiz bar. MATILDA korporaty bejermek 체챌in m체mkin ed첵채r, ullan챌ylary흫 y철netimini, dialoglary흫 du첵durmasyny, ullan챌ylary흫 interface'i흫 tiz adaptasi첵asyny her dile we nusgalanlary흫 챌철z체mlenmesini m체mkin ed첵채r. Qullanmak a흫satlyk, du첵durma h캇zyny we bellenen 챌철z체mleri hem ekspertler hem t채zelikler 체챌in de흫le첵채ris we bu araly흫 di흫e di흫e dijal du첵durma 체챌in doly pipelini destekle첵채ndigini 챌철z첵채ris emma teknik adamlary흫 muny a흫satlyk ulanmas캇na m체mkin ed첵채ris. Biz bu 채pi힊g채ni tamamlamak 체챌in a챌yl첵arys https://github.com/wluper/matilda We 철wrenme video1 ta첵첵arlamak 체챌in.", 'am': 'የጥያቄ ስርዓቶች በተለያዩ ፎርማዎች እና ፎርማቶች - የፖርት ረዳቶች (ሲሪ፣ አሌክካ፣ etc.), chat-bots፣ customer sup-port፣ chit-chat-ስርዓቶች በጥቂቶች ብቻ ለመስጠት ነው፡፡ የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች እና የፕሬዝዳንት ግንኙነት የግልጾች የNLP ግንኙነት ከፍተኛ ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን ዳርቻዎች አዋቂው አቁማዳ ናቸው፡፡ Our contribution to this essential pillar isMATILDA, to the best of our knowledge the first multi-annotator, multi-language dialogue annotation tool.  MATILDA የኮርፖርት መፍጠር፣ የተጠቃሚዎችን ማቀናጃ፣ የdialog ማስታወቂያ፣ የተጠቃሚው ማቀናጃ ፈጥኖ ማቀናቀል እና በቋንቋው ማቀናቀል እና አስተያየት ማቀናጃ እንዲፈቅድ ይፈቅዳል። የአስተማሪዎች እና የአንባቢዎች እና የመጠቀም ማቀናጃ ማቀናቀል እናስተዋልታለን፡፡ መሣሪያውን በሙሉ የተከፈቱትን https://github.com/wluper/matilda እና ትምህርት ቪዲዮ1 መፍታት::', 'sq': 'Dialogue Systems are becoming ubiquitous in various forms and shapes - virtual assistants(Siri, Alexa, etc.), chat-bots, customer sup-port, chit-chat systems just to name a few. Përparimet në modelet gjuhësore dhe publikimi i tyre kanë demokratizuar NLP të avancuar. Megjithatë, të dhënat mbeten një pengesë vendimtare. Kontributi ynë në këtë shtyllë thelbësore është MATILDA, për më të mirën e njohurive tona mjeti i parë multi-anotator, dialog shumëgjuhës anotacion. MATILDA lejon krijimin e korprës, menaxhimin e përdoruesve, anotacionin e dialogeve, përshtatjen e shpejtë të ndërfaqes së përdoruesit në çdo gjuhë dhe zgjidhjen e mosmarrëveshjes ndër-anotatorëve. Ne vlerësojmë mjetin mbi lehtësinë e përdorimit, shpejtësinë e anotacionit dhe zgjidhjen e ndëranotacionit për ekspertët dhe filluesit dhe përfundojmë se ky mjet jo vetëm mbështet tubacionin e plotë për anotacionin e dialogut, por gjithashtu lejon njerëzit jo-teknikë ta përdorin lehtë atë. Ne jemi krejtësisht të hapur burimin e mjetit në https://github.com/wluper/matilda - dhe të ofrojmë një video1 tutorial.', 'hy': 'Պատմելու համակարգերը տարբեր ձևերով և ձևերով դառնում են ամենուրեք՝ վիրտուալ օգնականներ (Սիրին, Ալեքսան, և այլն), զրուցային ռոբոտներ, հաճախորդի աջակցություն, շիթ-շիթ համակարգեր, որպեսզի մի քանի անվանենք: Լեզվային մոդելների և նրանց հրատարակության առաջընթացը դեմոկրատացրել է զարգացած ՆԼՊ-ը: Այնուամենայնիվ, տվյալները դեռևս կարևոր խոչընդոտ են: Մեր ներդրումը այս կարևոր աստիճանի մեջ MATILTA է, մեր լավագույն գիտելիքներից առաջին բազմա-annoտորային, բազմալեզվով երկխոսության annoտացիոն գործիքն է: MATILTA-ը թույլ է տալիս ստեղծել կոպորա, օգտագործողների ղեկավարումը, հաղորդագրությունները, օգտագործողի ինտերֆեյսի արագ ադապտացիան ցանկացած լեզվին և միջնատոտոտորների անհամաձայնության լուծումը: Մենք գնահատում ենք օգտագործման հեշտության, նոտացիայի արագության և ինտերնոտացիայի լուծումների գործիքը, և եզրակացում ենք, որ այս գործիքը ոչ միայն աջակցում է երկխոսային նոտացիայի ամբողջ խողովակաշարը, այլ նաև թույլ է տալիս ոչ տեխնիկական մարդկանց հեշտությամբ Մենք բացարձակ օգտագործում ենք գործիքը https://github.com/wluper/matilda - և դասավանդելու տեսանյութ1:', 'az': 'Dialog Sistemləri müxtəlif formlarda və şəkildə hərəkət edir - virtual asistanlar (Siri, Alexa, etc.), chat-botları, müşterilər sup-port, chit-chat sistemləri birkaç adı vermək üçün. Dil modellərində və yayınlıqlarında öyüd-nəsihət demokratik NLP oldu. Ancaq məlumatlar mövcuddur. Bizim bu məqsədil sütuna həyatımız MATILDA, ilk çoxlu danışmaq və çoxlu dil danışmaq vasitəsilə bilinmək üçün ən yaxşısıdır. MATILDA korpora yaradılışına, istifadəçilərin yönetiminə, dialogların xəbərdarlığına, hər dilə istifadəçinin arayüzünün hızlı uyğunlaşdırmasına və mübahisədən çəkinməsinə izin verir. Biz istifadə etmək üçün asanlıqla, məlumatların sürəti və məlumatların çözünürlüyünü təsdiqləyirik. Bu araç yalnızca dijalog məlumatlarının tamamlanmasını dəstəkləyir, lakin tekniki olmayan insanların bunu asanlıqla istifadə etməsinə imkan verir. Biz bu vasitələri tamamilə açıq-açıq https://github.com/wluper/matilda və öyrənmək video1 təmin edirlər.', 'bs': 'Sistemi dijaloga postaju svuda u raznim oblicima i oblicima - virtualni asistenti (Siri, Alexa, itd.), chat-boti, sup-port klijenata, chit-chat sistemi samo da bi nazvali nekoliko. Napredak jezičkih modela i njihova publikacija demokratizirao je napredni NLP. Međutim, podaci ostaju ključni vrat. Naš doprinos ovom temeljnom stupnju je MATILDA, na najbolje od našeg znanja, prvi multi-annotatorski, multi-jezički instrument za annotaciju dijaloga. MATILDA omogućava stvaranje korporacije, upravljanje korisnicima, annotaciju dijaloga, brzu adaptaciju korisničkog interfejsa na bilo koji jezik i rješavanje neslaganja međuannotatora. Procjenjujemo alat za lakšu upotrebu, brzinu annotacije i rezoluciju interannotacije stručnjaka i novinara i zaključujemo da ovaj alat ne samo podržava punu cijev za annotaciju dijaloga, nego također omogućava da ga nekotehnički ljudi lako koriste. Potpuno otvaramo alat u https://github.com/wluper/matilda I pružite nastavni video 1.', 'bn': 'বিভিন্ন ধরনে ডায়ালগ সিস্টেম বিভিন্ন ধরনের বিভিন্ন ধরনের বিভিন্ন ধরনে বিচ্ছিন্ন হয়ে যাচ্ছে - ভার্চুয়াল সহকারীদের (সিরি, আলেক্সা, ইত্যাদি), চ্যাট-ব ভাষার মডেল এবং তাদের প্রকাশনা গণতান্ত্রিক করেছে এনএলপি। তবে তথ্য একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বোতলেঙ্কের কারণে রয়েছে। আমাদের এই গুরুত্বপূর্ণ স্থান ইস্যামাটিল্ডারের প্রতি আমাদের অবদান, আমাদের জ্ঞানের সবচেয়ে ভালো কিছু, প্রথম বহুভাষার মাল MATILDA কোর্পোরা, ব্যবহারকারীদের ব্যবস্থাপনা, ডায়ালগের ব্যাখ্যা, ব্যবহারকারীর ইন্টারফেসের দ্রুত আপেটপেট এবং কোন ভাষার মধ্যে বিভিন্ন মতামতের সিদ্ধ আমরা বিশেষজ্ঞ এবং নোভিকের জন্য ব্যবহার, বিজ্ঞাপনের গতি এবং ইন্টারনেটারেশন সিদ্ধান্তের মূল্যায়ন করি এবং শেষ করে দেই যে এই টুল শুধুমাত্র আলোচনার বিষয়বস্তুর জন্য পুর আমরা পুরোপুরি উন্মুক্ত টুলের সোর্স করছি https://github.com/wluper/matilda  and provide a tutorial video1.', 'ca': "Els Dialogue Systems s s'estàn convertint en ubiquits en diverses formes i formes - assistents virtuals (Siri, Alexa, etc.), chat-bots, suport al client, chat-systems només per anomenar alguns. Els avanços en els models lingüístics i la seva publicació han democràticat el NLP avançat. Tot i així, les dades encara són un bloc d'ampolla crucial. La nostra contribució a aquest pilar essencial és MATILDA, pel millor que sabem, la primera eina d'anotació de diàleg multilingüístic. MATILDA permet crear corpora, gestionar els usuaris, anotar diàlegs, adaptar ràpidament l'interfície d'usuari a qualsevol llenguatge i resoldre el desacord entre els anotators. Evaluam l'eina sobre la fàcil utilització, la velocitat d'anotació i la resolució d'interannotació tant per experts com per principiants i concludem que aquesta eina no només suporta el sistema complet d'anotació del diàleg, sinó també permet que la gent no tècnica l'utilitzi fàcilment. Estem utilitzant l'eina completament oberta https://github.com/wluper/matilda i proporcionar un vídeo de tutoria1.", 'cs': 'Dialogové systémy se stávají všudypřítomnými v různých formách a tvarech – virtuálními asistenty (Siri, Alexa atd.), chatboty, podporou zákazníků, systémy chit-chatu, abychom jmenovali jen několik. Pokrok v jazykových modelech a jejich publikování demokratizoval pokročilé NLP. Údaje však zůstávají klíčovým úzkým místem. Náš příspěvek k tomuto základnímu pilíři je MATILDA, podle našich nejlepších znalostí první multi-anotátor, vícejazyčný dialogový anotace nástroj. MATILDA umožňuje tvorbu korpusů, správu uživatelů, anotaci dialogů, rychlé přizpůsobení uživatelského rozhraní libovolnému jazyku a řešení neshod mezi anotátory. Hodnotíme nástroj z hlediska snadnosti použití, rychlosti anotace a rozlišení interanotace pro odborníky i začátečníky a dospějeme k závěru, že tento nástroj nejen podporuje plné potrubí pro anotaci dialogu, ale také umožňuje jej snadno používat i netechničtí lidé. Nástroj zcela otevřeně nabízíme na webu: https://github.com/wluper/matilda a poskytnout tutoriál video1.', 'et': 'Dialoogisüsteemid on muutumas kõikjal levivaks erinevates vormides ja kujudes - virtuaalsed assistendid (Siri, Alexa jne), chat-botid, klienditoe-port, chit-chat süsteemid lihtsalt mõne nimetamiseks. Keelemudelite edusammud ja nende avaldamine on demokratiseerinud arenenud uue õppekava. Andmed jäävad siiski oluliseks kitsaskohaks. Meie panus sellesse olulisesse sambasse on MATILDA, meie parimate teadmiste kohaselt esimene mitmekeelne, mitmekeelne dialoogi annoteerimisvahend. MATILDA võimaldab luua korpuseid, hallata kasutajaid, anoteerida dialooge, kiiresti kohandada kasutajaliidest mis tahes keelega ja lahendada anotatoridevahelisi lahkarvamusi. Hindame vahendit nii ekspertide kui ka algajate jaoks kasutuslihtsuse, annoteerimiskiiruse ja interannoteerimise lahenduse kohta ning järeldame, et see vahend ei toeta mitte ainult dialoogi annoteerimise täielikku juhtmestikku, vaid võimaldab ka mittetehnilistel inimestel seda hõlpsasti kasutada. Me oleme täiesti avatud lähtekoodiga tööriista https://github.com/wluper/matilda ja esitada õpetusvideo1.', 'fi': 'Vuoropuhelujärjestelmät ovat yleistymässä eri muodoissa ja muodoissa - virtuaaliset avustajat (Siri, Alexa jne.), chat-botit, asiakastuki, chit-chat-järjestelmät vain muutamia mainitakseni. Kielimallien kehitys ja niiden julkaiseminen ovat demokratisoineet edistynyttä uutta oppimisohjelmaa. Tiedot ovat kuitenkin edelleen ratkaiseva pullonkaula. Osallistumme tähän olennaiseen pilariin MATILDA, joka on paras tietomme mukaan ensimmäinen monikielinen ja monikielinen vuoropuhelun huomautustyökalu. MATILDA mahdollistaa korpusten luomisen, käyttäjien hallinnan, dialogien merkitsemisen, käyttöliittymän nopean mukauttamisen mihin tahansa kieleen ja huomautusten välisten erimielisyyksien ratkaisemisen. Arvioimme työkalun helppokäyttöisyyttä, merkintöjen nopeutta ja vuorovaikutuksen resoluutiota sekä asiantuntijoille että aloittelijoille ja päättelemme, että tämä työkalu tukee vuoropuhelun merkintöjen koko putkistoa, mutta myös mahdollistaa ei-teknisten henkilöiden helpon käyttää sitä. Olemme täysin avoimen lähdekoodin työkalu osoitteessa https://github.com/wluper/matilda ja antaa opetusvideo1.', 'af': "Dialoog Stelsels word onbeskikbaar in verskeie vorms en vorms - virtuele assistente (Siri, Alexa, ensfh.), chat-bots, kliënt sup-poort, chit-chat stelsels net om 'n paar te naam. Die vorderings in taal modele en hulle publikasie het demokrasieer gevorderde NLP. Maar data bly 'n kruistelike botnek. Ons bydraai tot hierdie behoorlike pilar is MATILDA, tot die beste van ons kennis die eerste multi-annotator, multi-taal dialoog annotasie hulpmiddel. MATILDA laat toe die skepping van korpora, die bestuur van gebruikers, die annotasie van dialoog, die vinnige aanpassing van die gebruiker koppelvlak aan enige taal en die resolusie van inter annotator-ongelukking. Ons evalueer die hulpmiddel op maklik gebruik, annotasie spoed en interannotasie oplossing vir beide eksperte en nuuts en sluit dat hierdie hulpmiddel nie alleen die volle pyplyn ondersteun vir dialoog annotasie nie, maar ook toelaat nie-tegniese mense dit maklik gebruik. Ons is heeltemal open-sourcing van die hulpmiddel https://github.com/wluper/matilda en verskaf 'n onderwerp video1.", 'he': "מערכות דיאלוג הופכות לכל מקום בצורות וצורות שונות - עוזרים וירטואליים (Siri, Alexa, jne.), צ'אט-בוטים, תומכת לקוחות, מערכות צ'אט-צ'אט רק כדי להזכיר כמה. התקדמות בדוגמנים לשפה והפרסם שלהם דמוקרטיזמו NLP מתקדם. However, data remains a crucial bottleneck. התרומה שלנו לעמוד החיובי הזה היא MATILDA, לטובת הידע שלנו כלי הערות ראשון multi-annotator, multi-language dialog. MATILDA מאפשר ליצור corpora, ניהול של משתמשים, הערות של דיאלוגים, ההתאמה מהירה של ממשק המשתמש לכל שפה והפתרון של אי הסכם בין הערות. אנו מעריכים את הכל על קלות השימוש, מהירות הערות והפתרון בין הערות עבור המומחים וגם החדשים, ומסקנים שהכלי הזה לא רק תומך בצינור מלא עבור הערות דיאלוג, אלא גם מאפשר לאנשים לא טכניים להשתמש בו בקלות. We are completely open-sourcing the tool at  https://github.com/wluper/matilda ולספק וידאו לימוד 1.", 'jv': 'System Awakdhéwé éntuk karo model sing luwih lan publikasi ngéwé éntukokasi NLP luwih basa. Nanging, dadi mau durung bocah-bocah sing klêr. Rasané awak dhéwé nganggep barêng-barêng iki: MATILANDA, kanggo langgar terus kesempatan kanggo langgar bantuan, terus-terus kanggo langgar bantuan. MATILKA ngebah akeh nggawe ora seng akeh batir, nguasai pengguna, dialog kanggo anakno, dadi kanggo ngebah modhak karo perusahaan Language karo perusahaan sampeyan karo iso nglanggar. Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem kanggo nggawe usul, dadi tanggal lan tarjamahan kanggo resolusi layang lan alam kuwi perintah lan alam kuwi kesempalahan kanggo ngerasakno sistem iki ora oleh nggawe aturan kanggo ngilangno sistem sing apik dhéwé, dadi supoyata awak dhéwé, nik awak dhéwé ora oleh nggawe gerakan Open https://github.com/wluper/matilda Laptop" and "Desktop', 'ha': "KCharselect unicode block name Bayani da ke cikin misalin harshe da takardarsu sun samu'a gabatar da NLP. A lokacin da data za'a zama mai muhimu na sakin. Bayanmu na ƙari zuwa wannan bangon muhimu da isMATILDA, zuwa mafi kyaun sanyinmu na farkon zane da zane-zane-zane ga zauren mulki-mulki. MATILDA na yarda in ƙiƙiro firam, manajan masu amfani da shi, mai sanar da zauren akwatin bayani, kafin adaptan amfani da mai amfani da kwamfyuta don wata harshe ko cire-ƙunsa. Tuna ƙaddara kayan yi sauƙin amfani da mai amfani, da gaggawa da fassara mai fassar wa masu fitarwa da masu buƙata masu amfani da mazaɓa da yanzu kuma munã ƙara cewa wannan shiri ba ta ƙarfafa piflelin cikakken wa shirin ayukan zauren akwatin bayani, kuma amma yana yarda mutane waɗanda bã masu technical ba su yi amfani da shi da sauƙi. Ina buɗe kashi https://github.com/wluper/matilda kuma ka sami video 1.", 'sk': 'Dialogni sistemi postajajo vsepovsod v različnih oblikah in oblikah - virtualni pomočniki (Siri, Alexa itd.), chat-boti, podpora strankam, chit-klepetalni sistemi samo, da naštejem nekaj. Napredek jezikovnih modelov in njihova objava sta demokratizirala napredek NLP. Vendar pa podatki ostajajo ključno ozko grlo. Naš prispevek k temu bistvenemu stebru je MATILDA, po našem najboljšem znanju prvo orodje z več opombami, večjezikovnim dialogom. MATILDA omogoča ustvarjanje korpusov, upravljanje uporabnikov, oponašanje dialogov, hitro prilagajanje uporabniškega vmesnika kateremu koli jeziku in reševanje nesoglasja med oponašalci. Orodje ocenjujemo o enostavnosti uporabe, hitrosti označevanja in ločljivosti interoznačevanja za strokovnjake in začetnike ter ugotavljamo, da to orodje ne samo podpira celotnega načrta za označevanje dialoga, temveč tudi omogoča neihničnim ljudem, da ga enostavno uporabljajo. Orodje smo popolnoma odprti na spletni strani https://github.com/wluper/matilda in zagotovite video vodi1.', 'bo': 'གླེང་སྒྲོམ་གྱི་མ་ལག་གི་དབྱིབས་དབྱིབས་དང་དབྱིབས་ནང་གི་རྣམ་པ་མ་འདྲ་བར་ཆགས་ཡོད། རྒྱུ་མཚན་གྱི་ཞབས་ཞུ་བ(Siri, Alexa, etc.), གླེང་སྒྲོམ་གྱི་bots, ཞབས་ཞུ་བའི་sup སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་དང་ཁོ་ཚོའི་ཐོག་འགུལ་གྱི་མཐོ་རིམ་དེ་མང་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་NLP ཡར་རྒྱས ཡིན་ནའང་། ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་ཚོར་བ་ཁག་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཏུ་གནས་ཚུལ་རེད། ང་ཚོའི་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གལ་ཆེན་ཁང་གི་གླེང་སྒྲུང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་གོ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། MATILDA ཕན་ཚུན་སྒོ་འབྱེད་ཀྱི་གསར་འཛུགས་དང་། སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་དོ་དམ་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་annotation་ཚུ། སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་མཐུད་སྒྲིག་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་གང་རུང་ལ་ཐོག་ལས་མྱུར ང་ཚོས་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སླ་གཏོང་གི་ལག་ཆ་སྟངས་འཛིན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་ཚད། སྟོན་རྩོལ་བ་དང་གསར་གཏོང་འཕྲིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ལས་དབྱེ་བ་དག་རྩིས་ཡོད་ ང་ཚོས་རྩ་བའི་ལག་ཆ་ནི་ཁ་ཕྱེས་ཡོད་པ་དང་། https://github.com/wluper/matilda སྒྲ་བརྙན་གཟུགས་རིས་༡་བྱིན་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Forum 4.0 : An Open-Source User Comment Analysis Framework', 'fr': "Forum 4.0\xa0: Un cadre d'analyse des commentaires des utilisateurs open source", 'ar': 'المنتدى 4.0: إطار تحليل تعليقات المستخدم مفتوح المصدر', 'es': 'Forum 4.0: Un marco de análisis de comentarios de usuarios de código abierto', 'pt': 'Fórum 4.0: uma estrutura de análise de comentários de usuários de código aberto', 'ja': 'フォーラム4.0 ：オープンソースのユーザーコメント分析フレームワーク', 'zh': '论坛4.0曰:开源用户论析框架', 'hi': 'फोरम 4.0: एक ओपन-सोर्स उपयोगकर्ता टिप्पणी विश्लेषण फ्रेमवर्क', 'ru': 'Форум 4.0: платформа анализа комментариев пользователей с открытым исходным кодом', 'ga': 'Fóram 4.0: Creat Anailíse Tráchta Úsáideoirí Foinse Oscailte', 'ka': 'ფორმი 4.0: ახლა გამოყენებელი კონტაქტის ანალიზაციის კონტაქტი', 'hu': 'Fórum 4.0: Nyílt forráskódú felhasználói megjegyzések elemzési keretrendszer', 'el': 'Φόρουμ 4.0: Ένα πλαίσιο ανάλυσης σχολίων χρηστών ανοιχτού κώδικα', 'mk': 'Форум 4.0: Рамка за анализа на коментари на отворен код на корисникот', 'it': 'Forum 4.0: un framework di analisi dei commenti degli utenti open source', 'ml': 'ഫോറമ്\u200d 4. 0: ഒരു തുറന്ന സ്രോതസ്സ് ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ അളന്റ് ഫ്രെയിംവര്\u200dക്ക്', 'kk': '4.0 форумы: Ашық көзі пайдаланушының түсініктемесін талдау фреймі', 'lt': '4.0 forumas: atvirojo šaltinio naudotojų komentarų analizės sistema', 'ms': 'Forum 4.0: An Open-Source User Comment Analysis Framework', 'mt': 'Forum 4.0: Qafas ta’ Analiżi tal-Kummenti tal-Utenti b’Sors Miftuħ', 'pl': 'Forum 4.0: Open-Source Framework analizy komentarzy użytkowników', 'ro': 'Forum 4.0: Un cadru de analiză a comentariilor utilizatorilor cu sursă deschisă', 'sr': 'Forum 4.0: okvir analize komentara korisnika otvorenog izvora', 'si': '4.0 ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය: විවෘත ප්\u200dරවේශකය ප්\u200dරවේශකය විශ්ලේෂණ ක්\u200dරමය', 'sv': 'Forum 4.0: Ett ramverk för analys av användarkommentarer med öppen källkod', 'so': 'Forum 4.0: An Open Source User Comment', 'mn': 'Форум 4.0: Автор эх үүсвэрийн хэрэглэгчийн Түсэглэгчийн Шалгаан Фрейм', 'ta': 'Forum 4. 0: ஒரு திறந்த மூலத்தின் பயனீட்டாளர் சட்டத்தை ஆராய்வுComment', 'no': 'Forum 4.0: Eit rammeverk for å analysera kommentar på opna kjeldebrukar', 'ur': 'فورمن 4.0: ایک اوپن-سورس یوسٹر کام شناسایی فرمورک', 'uz': 'Forum 4. 0: Ochiq manba foydalanuvchiComment', 'vi': 'Forum 4.0: Một bộ phân tích người dùng xuất bản', 'bg': 'Форум 4.0: Рамка за анализ на коментарите на потребителите с отворен код', 'da': 'Forum 4.0: En open source brugerkommentarsanalyse ramme', 'hr': 'Forum 4.0: okvir analize komentara korisnika otvorenog izvora', 'nl': 'Forum 4.0: Een Open-Source User Comment Analysis Framework', 'id': 'Forum 4.0: Sebuah Framework Analisi Komentar Pengguna Sumber Buka', 'de': 'Forum 4.0: Ein Open-Source User Comment Analysis Framework', 'ko': 'Forum 4.0: 소스 기반 사용자 의견 분석 프레임워크', 'fa': 'فرم ۴.۰: یک فرم شناسایی نمونه\u200cهای کاربر منبع باز', 'tr': 'Forum 4.0: Aç-Kaynak Ullançy Şahsy Taýýarlama Framesi', 'sq': 'Forum 4.0: Një Kornizë e Analizës së Komentarëve të Përdoruesit me Burim të Hapur', 'af': "Forum 4.0: ' n Open-Bron Gebruiker Kommentaar Analiseer Raamwerk", 'sw': 'Jukwaa 4.0: Mtumiaji wa vyanzo vya wazi vya Uchambuzi Comment', 'am': 'Forum 4.0: An Open-Source User Comment Analysis Framework', 'hy': 'Ֆորմում 4.0: Օգտագործողի մեկնաբանության բաց կոդը', 'az': 'Forum 4.0: Açıq-Kaynak İstifadəçi Şehri Analizi Framework', 'ca': 'Forum 4.0: An Open-Source User Comment Analysis Framework', 'bn': 'ফোরাম ৪. ০: একটি খোলা সূত্র ব্যবহারকারীর বিশ্লেষণ ফ্রেম', 'bs': 'Forum 4.0: okvir analize komentara korisnika otvorenog izvora', 'cs': 'Fórum 4.0: Open-Source User Comment Analysis Framework', 'fi': 'Forum 4.0: Open-Source User Comment Analysis Framework', 'et': 'Foorum 4.0: avatud lähtekoodiga kasutaja kommentaaride analüüsi raamistik', 'jv': 'forum 4.0: A Open-Source User Name', 'sk': 'Forum 4.0: Okvir za analizo odprtokodnih komentarjev uporabnikov', 'ha': 'Forum 4. 0: An Analyze Frame', 'bo': 'Forum 4.0: Open-Source User Comment Analysis Framework', 'he': 'פורום 4. 0: מסגר ניתוח הערות של משתמשים מקור פתוח'}
{'en': 'With the increasing number of user comments in diverse domains, including comments on online journalism and e-commerce websites, the manual content analysis of these comments becomes time-consuming and challenging. However, research showed that user comments contain useful information for different domain experts, which is thus worth finding and utilizing. This paper introduces Forum 4.0, an open-source framework to semi-automatically analyze, aggregate, and visualize user comments based on labels defined by domain experts. We demonstrate the applicability of Forum 4.0 with comments analytics scenarios within the domains of online journalism and app stores. We outline the underlying container architecture, including the web-based user interface, the machine learning component, and the task manager for time-consuming tasks. We finally conduct machine learning experiments with simulated annotations and different sampling strategies on existing datasets from both domains to evaluate Forum 4.0’s performance. Forum 4.0 achieves promising classification results (ROC-AUC   0.9 with 100 annotated samples), utilizing transformer-based embeddings with a lightweight logistic regression model. We explain how Forum 4.0’s architecture is applicable for millions of user comments in real-time, yet at feasible training and classification costs.', 'fr': "Avec le nombre croissant de commentaires d'utilisateurs dans divers domaines, y compris les commentaires sur le journalisme en ligne et les sites Web de commerce électronique, l'analyse manuelle du contenu de ces commentaires prend du temps et devient un défi. Cependant, les recherches ont montré que les commentaires des utilisateurs contiennent des informations utiles pour différents experts du domaine, ce qui vaut la peine d'être trouvé et utilisé. Cet article présente Forum 4.0, un framework open source permettant d'analyser, d'agréger et de visualiser de manière semi-automatique les commentaires des utilisateurs sur la base d'étiquettes définies par des experts du domaine. Nous démontrons l'applicabilité de Forum 4.0 avec des scénarios d'analyse des commentaires dans les domaines du journalisme en ligne et des boutiques d'applications. Nous décrivons l'architecture de conteneur sous-jacente, y compris l'interface utilisateur Web, le composant d'apprentissage automatique et le gestionnaire de tâches pour les tâches fastidieuses. Enfin, nous menons des expériences d'apprentissage automatique avec des annotations simulées et différentes stratégies d'échantillonnage sur des ensembles de données existants des deux domaines afin d'évaluer les performances de Forum 4.0. Forum 4.0 obtient des résultats de classification prometteurs (ROC-AUC 0.9 avec 100 échantillons annotés), en utilisant des intégrations basées sur des transformateurs avec un modèle de régression logistique léger. Nous expliquons comment l'architecture de Forum 4.0 est applicable à des millions de commentaires d'utilisateurs en temps réel, mais à des coûts de formation et de classification réalisables.", 'pt': 'Com o número crescente de comentários de usuários em diversos domínios, incluindo comentários em sites de jornalismo online e e-commerce, a análise manual do conteúdo desses comentários torna-se demorada e desafiadora. No entanto, a pesquisa mostrou que os comentários dos usuários contêm informações úteis para diferentes especialistas de domínio, o que vale a pena encontrar e utilizar. Este artigo apresenta o Forum 4.0, uma estrutura de código aberto para analisar, agregar e visualizar semiautomaticamente os comentários dos usuários com base em rótulos definidos por especialistas do domínio. Demonstramos a aplicabilidade do Forum 4.0 com cenários de análise de comentários nos domínios do jornalismo online e lojas de aplicativos. Descrevemos a arquitetura de contêiner subjacente, incluindo a interface de usuário baseada na Web, o componente de aprendizado de máquina e o gerenciador de tarefas para tarefas demoradas. Finalmente, realizamos experimentos de aprendizado de máquina com anotações simuladas e diferentes estratégias de amostragem em conjuntos de dados existentes de ambos os domínios para avaliar o desempenho do Forum 4.0. O Forum 4.0 alcança resultados de classificação promissores (ROC-AUC 0.9 com 100 amostras anotadas), utilizando incorporações baseadas em transformador com um modelo de regressão logística leve. Explicamos como a arquitetura do Forum 4.0 é aplicável a milhões de comentários de usuários em tempo real, mas com custos viáveis de treinamento e classificação.', 'ar': 'مع تزايد عدد تعليقات المستخدمين في مجالات متنوعة ، بما في ذلك التعليقات على الصحافة عبر الإنترنت ومواقع التجارة الإلكترونية ، يصبح تحليل المحتوى اليدوي لهذه التعليقات مستهلكًا للوقت وصعبًا. ومع ذلك ، أظهر البحث أن تعليقات المستخدم تحتوي على معلومات مفيدة لخبراء المجال المختلفين ، الأمر الذي يستحق بالتالي البحث عنه والاستفادة منه. تقدم هذه الورقة المنتدى 4.0 ، وهو إطار عمل مفتوح المصدر لتحليل تعليقات المستخدمين وتجميعها وتصورها بشكل شبه تلقائي استنادًا إلى التسميات التي يحددها خبراء المجال. نثبت قابلية تطبيق Forum 4.0 مع سيناريوهات تحليلات التعليقات في مجالات الصحافة عبر الإنترنت ومتاجر التطبيقات. نحدد بنية الحاوية الأساسية ، بما في ذلك واجهة المستخدم المستندة إلى الويب ومكون التعلم الآلي ومدير المهام للمهام التي تستغرق وقتًا طويلاً. أخيرًا نجري تجارب التعلم الآلي مع التعليقات التوضيحية المحاكاة واستراتيجيات أخذ العينات المختلفة على مجموعات البيانات الحالية من كلا المجالين لتقييم أداء المنتدى 4.0. يحقق Forum 4.0 نتائج تصنيف واعدة (ROC-AUC 0.9 مع 100 عينة مشروحة) ، باستخدام الزخارف القائمة على المحولات مع نموذج انحدار لوجستي خفيف الوزن. نشرح كيف يمكن تطبيق بنية المنتدى 4.0 لملايين تعليقات المستخدمين في الوقت الفعلي ، ولكن بتكاليف تدريب وتصنيف ممكنة.', 'es': 'Con el creciente número de comentarios de los usuarios en diversos dominios, incluidos los comentarios sobre periodismo en línea y sitios web de comercio electrónico, el análisis manual del contenido de estos comentarios se convierte en un desafío y lleva mucho tiempo. Sin embargo, la investigación mostró que los comentarios de los usuarios contienen información útil para diferentes expertos en el dominio, que vale la pena encontrar y utilizar. Este documento presenta Forum 4.0, un marco de código abierto para analizar, agregar y visualizar de forma semiautomática los comentarios de los usuarios en función de etiquetas definidas por expertos en el dominio. Demostramos la aplicabilidad de Forum 4.0 con escenarios de análisis de comentarios dentro de los dominios del periodismo en línea y las tiendas de aplicaciones. Describimos la arquitectura de contenedores subyacente, incluida la interfaz de usuario basada en web, el componente de aprendizaje automático y el administrador de tareas para tareas que requieren mucho tiempo. Finalmente, realizamos experimentos de aprendizaje automático con anotaciones simuladas y diferentes estrategias de muestreo en conjuntos de datos existentes de ambos dominios para evaluar el rendimiento de Forum 4.0. Forum 4.0 logra resultados de clasificación prometedores (ROC-AUC 0.9 con 100 muestras anotadas), utilizando incrustaciones basadas en transformadores con un modelo de regresión logística ligero. Explicamos cómo la arquitectura de Forum 4.0 se puede aplicar a millones de comentarios de usuarios en tiempo real, pero a costos factibles de capacitación y clasificación.', 'ja': 'オンラインジャーナリズムやeコマースウェブサイトのコメントを含む多様なドメインのユーザーコメントの数が増加するにつれて、これらのコメントのマニュアルコンテンツ分析は時間がかかり、困難になります。 しかし、研究によると、ユーザーのコメントにはさまざまなドメインの専門家にとって有用な情報が含まれているため、それを見つけて活用する価値があることが示されました。 この論文では、ドメインエキスパートが定義したラベルに基づいて、ユーザーコメントを半自動的に分析、集約、視覚化するオープンソースのフレームワークであるForum 4.0を紹介します。 オンラインジャーナリズムとアプリストアのドメイン内のコメント分析シナリオで、Forum 4.0の適用性を実証しています。 Webベースのユーザーインターフェース、機械学習コンポーネント、時間のかかるタスクのためのタスクマネージャーを含む、基礎となるコンテナアーキテクチャを概説します。 最終的に、両方のドメインの既存のデータセットについて、シミュレートされた注釈と異なるサンプリング戦略を使用して機械学習実験を行い、Forum 4.0のパフォーマンスを評価します。 フォーラム4.0は、軽量なロジスティック回帰モデルを備えた変圧器ベースの埋め込みを利用して、有望な分類結果（注釈付きサンプル100個でROC - AUC 0.9 ）を達成します。 フォーラム4.0のアーキテクチャが、実現可能なトレーニングと分類コストで、リアルタイムで数百万のユーザーコメントにどのように適用されるかを説明します。', 'zh': '随用户异域之论增益,兼在线新闻电子商务网站之论,其手动内容分析转耗时而有挑战性。 然研明用户论包异域专家者,以此见用。 本文言Forum 4.0,此一开源框架也,所以据领域专家定义之标签半自动析,总与可视化用户论。 在线新闻与商店论Forum 4.0适用性。 吾概述底器架构,盖 Web 之用户界面、机器之学组件与行耗时之任管理器。 最后模拟注释及两域见有数据集采样策机器学实验,以质 Forum 4.0 性。 论坛4.0遂其类(ROC-AUC 0.9,100注样本),因变压器嵌轻量级逻辑以归。 臣等解 Forum 4.0 之架构实时宜用数百万用户论,兼须支可行培训类成本。', 'ru': 'С ростом числа пользовательских комментариев в различных областях, включая комментарии на сайтах онлайновой журналистики и электронной коммерции, ручной анализ содержания этих комментариев становится трудоемким и сложным. Однако исследования показали, что комментарии пользователей содержат полезную информацию для экспертов в различных областях, которую, таким образом, стоит найти и использовать. В этой статье представлен Форум 4.0, структура с открытым исходным кодом для полуавтоматического анализа, агрегирования и визуализации комментариев пользователей на основе меток, определенных экспертами в области. Мы демонстрируем применимость Forum 4.0 со сценариями аналитики комментариев в доменах интернет-журналистики и магазинах приложений. Мы описываем базовую архитектуру контейнеров, включая веб-интерфейс пользователя, компонент машинного обучения и диспетчер задач для трудоемких задач. Наконец, мы проводим эксперименты по машинному обучению с смоделированными аннотациями и различными стратегиями выборки на существующих наборах данных из обеих областей для оценки эффективности работы Форума 4.0. Forum 4.0 достигает многообещающих результатов классификации (ROC-AUC  0.9 со 100 аннотированными образцами), используя вкладыши на основе трансформаторов с легкой моделью логистической регрессии. Мы объясняем, как архитектура Форума 4.0 применима к миллионам пользовательских комментариев в режиме реального времени, но с возможными затратами на обучение и классификацию.', 'hi': 'ऑनलाइन पत्रकारिता और ई-कॉमर्स वेबसाइटों पर टिप्पणियों सहित विभिन्न डोमेन में उपयोगकर्ता टिप्पणियों की बढ़ती संख्या के साथ, इन टिप्पणियों का मैनुअल सामग्री विश्लेषण समय लेने वाला और चुनौतीपूर्ण हो जाता है। हालांकि, शोध से पता चला है कि उपयोगकर्ता टिप्पणियों में विभिन्न डोमेन विशेषज्ञों के लिए उपयोगी जानकारी होती है, जो इस प्रकार खोजने और उपयोग करने के लायक है। यह पेपर फोरम 4.0 का परिचय देता है, जो डोमेन विशेषज्ञों द्वारा परिभाषित लेबल के आधार पर अर्ध-स्वचालित रूप से विश्लेषण, समग्र और उपयोगकर्ता टिप्पणियों की कल्पना करने के लिए एक ओपन-सोर्स फ्रेमवर्क है। हम ऑनलाइन पत्रकारिता और ऐप स्टोर के डोमेन के भीतर टिप्पणी विश्लेषिकी परिदृश्यों के साथ फोरम 4.0 की प्रयोज्यता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं। हम अंतर्निहित कंटेनर आर्किटेक्चर को रेखांकित करते हैं, जिसमें वेब-आधारित उपयोगकर्ता इंटरफ़ेस, मशीन लर्निंग घटक और समय लेने वाले कार्यों के लिए कार्य प्रबंधक शामिल हैं। हम अंततः फोरम 4.0 के प्रदर्शन का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए दोनों डोमेन से मौजूदा डेटासेट पर सिम्युलेटेड एनोटेशन और विभिन्न नमूना रणनीतियों के साथ मशीन लर्निंग प्रयोगों का संचालन करते हैं। फोरम 4.0 आशाजनक वर्गीकरण परिणाम (100 एनोटेट नमूनों के साथ आरओसी-एयूसी 0.9) प्राप्त करता है, एक हल्के रसद प्रतिगमन मॉडल के साथ ट्रांसफार्मर-आधारित एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करता है। हम समझाते हैं कि फोरम 4.0 की वास्तुकला वास्तविक समय में लाखों उपयोगकर्ता टिप्पणियों के लिए कैसे लागू होती है, फिर भी व्यवहार्य प्रशिक्षण और वर्गीकरण लागत पर।', 'ga': 'De bharr go bhfuil méadú ag teacht ar líon na dtuairimí ó úsáideoirí i réimsí éagsúla, lena n-áirítear tráchtanna ar shuímh Ghréasáin iriseoireachta agus ríomhthráchtála ar líne, éiríonn anailís láimhe ar ábhar na dtuairimí sin am-íditheach agus dúshlánach. Mar sin féin, léirigh taighde go bhfuil faisnéis úsáideach le haghaidh saineolaithe fearainn éagsúla i dtuairimí úsáideoirí, ar fiú é a aimsiú agus a úsáid. Tugann an páipéar seo isteach Fóram 4.0, creat foinse oscailte chun anailís leath-uathoibríoch, comhiomlánú agus léirshamhlú a dhéanamh ar thuairimí úsáideoirí bunaithe ar lipéid arna sainiú ag saineolaithe fearainn. Léirímid infheidhmeacht Fhóram 4.0 le cásanna anailíse tuairimí laistigh de réimsí na hiriseoireachta ar líne agus na siopaí aipeanna. Déanaimid breac-chuntas ar ailtireacht bhunúsach na gcoimeádán, lena n-áirítear an comhéadan úsáideora gréasán-bhunaithe, an chomhpháirt meaisínfhoghlama, agus an bainisteoir tascanna le haghaidh tascanna a thógann am. Déanaimid turgnaimh mheaisínfhoghlama ar deireadh le nótaí ionsamhlaithe agus straitéisí samplála éagsúla ar thacair shonraí atá ann cheana ón dá fhearann chun feidhmíocht Fhóram 4.0 a mheas. Baineann Fóram 4.0 amach torthaí aicmithe a bhfuil gealladh fúthu (ROC-AUC 0.9 le 100 sampla anótáilte), ag baint úsáide as leabaithe claochladán-bhunaithe le samhail aischéimniúcháin lóistíochta éadrom. Mínímid conas atá ailtireacht Fhóram 4.0 infheidhme ar na milliúin tuairimí úsáideoirí i bhfíor-am, ach ag costais oiliúna agus rangaithe indéanta.', 'el': 'Με τον αυξανόμενο αριθμό σχολίων χρηστών σε διάφορους τομείς, συμπεριλαμβανομένων σχολίων σε διαδικτυακές ιστοσελίδες δημοσιογραφίας και ηλεκτρονικού εμπορίου, η χειρωνακτική ανάλυση περιεχομένου αυτών των σχολίων γίνεται χρονοβόρα και προκλητική. Ωστόσο, η έρευνα έδειξε ότι τα σχόλια των χρηστών περιέχουν χρήσιμες πληροφορίες για διαφορετικούς ειδικούς τομείς, οι οποίες επομένως αξίζει να βρεθούν και να χρησιμοποιηθούν. Η παρούσα εργασία εισάγει το Φόρουμ 4.0, ένα πλαίσιο ανοιχτού κώδικα για την ημιαυτόματη ανάλυση, συγκέντρωση και απεικόνιση σχολίων χρηστών με βάση ετικέτες που ορίζονται από ειδικούς στον τομέα. Επιδεικνύουμε τη δυνατότητα εφαρμογής του Φόρουμ 4.0 με σενάρια ανάλυσης σχολίων στους τομείς της διαδικτυακής δημοσιογραφίας και των καταστημάτων εφαρμογών. Περιγράφουμε την υποκείμενη αρχιτεκτονική εμπορευματοκιβωτίων, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της διεπαφής χρήστη με βάση το διαδίκτυο, του στοιχείου μηχανικής μάθησης και του διαχειριστή εργασιών για χρονοβόρες εργασίες. Τέλος διεξάγουμε πειράματα μηχανικής μάθησης με προσομοιωμένες σχολιασμούς και διαφορετικές στρατηγικές δειγματοληψίας σε υπάρχοντα σύνολα δεδομένων και από τους δύο τομείς για να αξιολογήσουμε την απόδοση του Φόρουμ 4.0. Το φόρουμ 4.0 επιτυγχάνει πολλά υποσχόμενα αποτελέσματα ταξινόμησης (με 100 σχολιασμένα δείγματα), χρησιμοποιώντας ενσωματώσεις βασισμένες στον μετασχηματιστή με ένα ελαφρύ μοντέλο λογιστικής παλινδρόμησης. Εξηγούμε πώς η αρχιτεκτονική του είναι εφαρμόσιμη για εκατομμύρια σχόλια χρηστών σε πραγματικό χρόνο, αλλά με εφικτό κόστος εκπαίδευσης και ταξινόμησης.', 'hu': 'A különböző területeken megjelenő felhasználói megjegyzések számának növekedésével, beleértve az online újságírással és az e-kereskedelmi weboldalakkal kapcsolatos megjegyzéseket, ezeknek a megjegyzéseknek a manuális tartalom elemzése időigényessé és kihívást jelent. A kutatások azonban kimutatták, hogy a felhasználói megjegyzések hasznos információkat tartalmaznak különböző domain szakértők számára, ezért érdemes megtalálni és használni. A tanulmány bemutatja a Forum 4.0-t, egy nyílt forráskódú keretrendszert, amely félautomatikusan elemezi, összesíti és megjeleníti a felhasználói megjegyzéseket a domain szakértők által meghatározott címkék alapján. A Forum 4.0 alkalmazhatóságát megjegyzések analitikai forgatókönyvekkel mutatjuk be az online újságírás és az app áruházak területén. Felvázoljuk az alapul szolgáló konténer architektúrát, beleértve a webalapú felhasználói felületet, a gépi tanulási összetevőt és a feladatkezelőt az időigényes feladatokhoz. Végül gépi tanulási kísérleteket végezünk szimulált jegyzetekkel és különböző mintavételi stratégiákkal mindkét területről, hogy értékeljük a Forum 4.0 teljesítményét. A Forum 4.0 ígéretes osztályozási eredményeket ér el (ROC-AUC 0.9 100 jegyzetelt mintával), transzformátor alapú beágyazásokat használva egy könnyű logisztikai regressziós modell. Elmagyarázzuk, hogyan alkalmazható a Forum 4.0 architektúra több millió felhasználói megjegyzésre valós idejű, de megvalósítható képzési és osztályozási költségek mellett.', 'ka': 'მომხმარებელი კომენტაქტების უფრო მეტი გაზრდებით განსხვავებული დომენეში, რომელსაც კომენტაქტები ინტერნეული ზურნალიზმის და e-კომენტის საბოლოების შესახებ, ამ კომენტაქტების ხელსაწ მაგრამ შესწავლობა გამოყენებელი კომენტრებების შესახებ გამოყენებელი ინფორმაცია განსხვავებული დომინის ექსპერტებისთვის, რომელიც უფრო უფრო ეს დოკუმენტი გაჩვენებს 4. 0 ფორმა, სახელ- ავტომატურად ანალიზაციის, ადგრეგურაციის და ვიზუალიზაციის მომხმარებელი კომენტრებები, რომლებიც დომინის ექსპერტებით ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ფორმის 4.0-ის მომხმარება, რომელიც კომენტრებების ანალიტიკური სენარიოებით ინტერნეული ჯერნალიზმის და პროგრამების სახლეში. ჩვენ შევხედავთ ინტერფექტიკური კონტენექტიკური აქტიქტიკური, სამუშაო მომხმარებელი ინტერფექტი, მაქსინის სწავლების კონომპონენტი და დავამხ ჩვენ საბოლოოდ მანქანის სწავლების ექსპერიმენტები გავაკეთებთ სიმულაციული ანოტაციებით და განსხვავებული მონაცემების სტრატიგიების შესახებ ორივე დიომენტებიდან გავაკეთებთ 4 4.0 ფორმა მიიღება საკუთარი კლასიფიკაციის შედეგები (ROC-AUC  0.9, 100 ანოტირებული ნაგულებით) რომელიც გამოყენება ტრანფორმაციის ბაზეული ინბიდრებების გამოყენება ლოგისტიკური რეგრესიის მოდე ჩვენ განვიხსნავთ, როგორ აქტიქტურის 4.0-ის აქტიქტურა მომხმარებელი მომხმარებელი კომენტრებისთვის, მაგრამ შესაძლებელი განსწავლება და კლასიფიკაციის ღირება.', 'kk': 'Әртүрлі домендерде пайдаланушылардың түсініктемелерін көтеріп, онлайн журналистік және e-commerce вебсайттарының түсініктемелерін қолмен анализ болады. Бірақ зерттеулерде, пайдаланушының түсініктемелерінде әртүрлі доменнің эксперттеріне пайдалы мәлімет бар дегенді көрсетті. Бұл үшін іздеу мен пайдалануға ти Бұл қағаз 4. 0 форумын, домен эксперттерінің анықталған жарлықтарына негізделген жарлықтарды талдау, агрегиру және пайдаланушының түсініктемелерін көрсету үшін ашық көзінің фреймін көрсетеді. Біз 4.0 форумының қолданбаларын онлайн журналистік мен қолданбалар сақтаушыларының домендерінде аналитикалық сценарияларын көрсетедік. Мұндай контейнер архитектурасын, веб- негіздеген пайдаланушылар интерфейсі, машина оқыту компоненті және уақыт пайдалану тапсырмаларының тапсырмалар менеджерін көрсетеді. Соңғы сәтте 4.0 форумының істемін бағалау үшін машинаны оқыту тәжірибелерін және барлық деректер қорларының түрлі баптау стратегияларынан басқа түрлі баптау стратегияларын жасадық. 4. 0 форумы үлкен классификациялау нәтижелерін жеткізеді (ROC- AUC - 0. 9 100 белгіленген үлгілерімен) түрлендіруші негізінде жүктеу үлгілерін қолданады. Біз 4.0 форумының архитектурасы дұрыс уақытта миллион пайдаланушылардың түсініктемелеріне қалай қолданылатынын түсініп береміз, бірақ оқыту және классификациялық бағаларына қа', 'it': "Con il crescente numero di commenti degli utenti in diversi domini, inclusi i commenti sul giornalismo online e sui siti di e-commerce, l'analisi manuale dei contenuti di questi commenti diventa dispendiosa e impegnativa. Tuttavia, la ricerca ha dimostrato che i commenti degli utenti contengono informazioni utili per diversi esperti di dominio, che vale la pena trovare e utilizzare. Questo articolo introduce Forum 4.0, un framework open source per analizzare, aggregare e visualizzare semi-automaticamente i commenti degli utenti sulla base di etichette definite dagli esperti del dominio. Dimostriamo l'applicabilità del Forum 4.0 con scenari di analisi dei commenti all'interno dei domini del giornalismo online e degli app store. Descriviamo l'architettura dei container sottostante, tra cui l'interfaccia utente basata sul web, il componente di apprendimento automatico e il task manager per le attività che richiedono tempo. Infine conduciamo esperimenti di machine learning con annotazioni simulate e diverse strategie di campionamento su set di dati esistenti da entrambi i domini per valutare le prestazioni del Forum 4.0. Forum 4.0 raggiunge risultati promettenti di classificazione (ROC-AUC 0.9 con 100 campioni annotati), utilizzando incorporazioni basate su trasformatori con un modello di regressione logistica leggero. Spieghiamo come l'architettura di Forum 4.0 sia applicabile a milioni di commenti degli utenti in tempo reale, ma a costi di formazione e classificazione fattibili.", 'lt': 'Kadangi daugėja vartotojų pastabų įvairiose srityse, įskaitant pastabas dėl internetinės žurnalistikos ir e. prekybos interneto svetainių, šių pastabų turinio analizė rankiniu būdu tampa ilgai trunkanti ir sudėtinga. Tačiau moksliniai tyrimai parodė, kad vartotojų pastabose pateikiama naudinga informacija įvairių sričių ekspertams, todėl verta rasti ir panaudoti šią informaciją. Šiame dokumente pateikiamas forumas 4.0, atvirojo kodo sistema, skirta pusiau automatiškai analizuoti, suvestinti ir vizualizuoti naudotojų pastabas, grindžiamas srities ekspertų apibrėžtomis etiketėmis. Mes parodome forumo 4.0 taikymą su komentarų analizės scenarijais internetinės žurnalistijos ir aplikacijų parduotuvų srityse. Mes apibūdiname pagrindinę konteinerių architektūrą, įskaitant internetinę naudotojų sąsają, mašinų mokymosi komponentą ir užduočių valdytoją, atliekantį užduotis, kurioms reikia laiko. Galiausiai atliekame mašinų mokymosi eksperimentus su simuliuotomis anotacijomis ir skirtingomis mėginių ėmimo strategijomis dėl esamų duomenų rinkinių iš abiejų sričių, kad įvertintume 4.0 forumo veiklos rezultatus. 4.0 forume gaunami žadantys klasifikavimo rezultatai (ROC-AUC – 0,9 su 100 užrašytų mėginių), naudojant transformatoriumi pagrįstus įterpimus su lengvu logistiniu regresijos modeliu. Paaiškiname, kaip 4.0 forumo architektūra taikoma milijonams naudotojų komentarų realiuoju laiku, tačiau įgyvendinamomis mokymo ir klasifikavimo išlaidomis.', 'ms': "Dengan jumlah yang meningkat komentar pengguna dalam domain berbeza, termasuk komentar pada wartawan online dan laman-laman perdagangan e-mel, analisis kandungan manual komentar ini menjadi memakan masa dan mencabar. Namun, kajian menunjukkan bahawa ulasan pengguna mengandungi maklumat berguna untuk ahli domain yang berbeza, yang seharusnya ditemui dan digunakan. Kertas ini memperkenalkan Forum 4.0, kerangka sumber terbuka untuk menganalisis, aggregat dan visualisasi ulasan pengguna berdasarkan label yang ditakrif oleh ahli domain. Kami menunjukkan kemudahan Forum 4.0 dengan skenario analitik komentar dalam domain wartawanan online dan kedai aplikasi. Kami menggambarkan arkitektur bekas yang didasarkan, termasuk antaramuka pengguna berdasarkan web, komponen pembelajaran mesin, dan pengurus tugas untuk tugas yang memakan masa. We finally conduct machine learning experiments with simulated annotations and different sampling strategies on existing datasets from both domains to evaluate Forum 4.0's performance.  Forum 4.0 mencapai keputusan klasifikasi yang berjanji (ROC-AUC  0.9 dengan 100 sampel yang dicatat), menggunakan penyambungan berasaskan pengubah dengan model regresi logistik ringan. Kita jelaskan bagaimana arkitektur Forum 4.0 berlaku untuk jutaan ulasan pengguna dalam masa sebenar, namun pada biaya latihan dan klasifikasi yang boleh dilakukan.", 'mk': 'Со зголемениот број коментари на корисниците во различни домени, вклучително и коментари за онлајн новинарство и веб-страници за електронска трговија, рачната анализа на содржината на овие коментари станува временско потрошувачка и предизвикувачка. Сепак, истражувањата покажаа дека корисните коментари на корисниците содржат корисни информации за различни експерти во домените, што значи дека вреди да се најде и искористи. This paper introduces Forum 4.0, an open-source framework to semi-automatically analyze, aggregate, and visualize user comments based on labels defined by domain experts.  Демонстрираме апликабилност на Форумот 4.0 со сценарија за аналитички коментари во домените на онлајн новинарство и продавниците за апликации. Ние ја опишуваме основната архитектура на контејнерот, вклучувајќи го и веб-базираниот кориснички интерфејс, компонентот за машинско учење и менаџерот на задачи за задачи кои потрошуваат време. Конечно спроведуваме експерименти за машинско учење со симулирани анотации и различни стратегии за примерување на постоечките податоци од двата домени за да ја процениме перформансата на Форумот 4.0. Форумот 4.0 постигнува ветувачки резултати од класификацијата (ROC-AUC ≤ 0,9 со 100 анотирани примероци), користејќи трансформаторски внесувања со лесен логистички регресен модел. Ние објаснуваме како архитектурата на Форумот 4.0 се применува за милиони корисници коментари во реално време, но и покрај успешните трошоци за обука и класификација.', 'ml': 'വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡോമെനുകളില്\u200d ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ അഭിപ്രായങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d, ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d ജോര്\u200dണിസ്റ്റലിസ്റ്റും ഇ-കമ് എന്നാലും പരിശോധന കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ കണക്കുകളില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d വിശേഷപ്രദക ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഫോറമ്\u200d 4. 0, ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d വിശേഷികളാല്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്ന ചിത്രങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കി ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ അഭിപ്രായങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു തുറന ഫോറമ്\u200d 4.0 ന്റെ പ്രയോഗത്തെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. അഭിപ്രായശ്ചിത്രത്തിന്റെ വിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d പത്ര We outline the underlying container architecture, including the web-based user interface, the machine learning component, and the task manager for time-consuming tasks.  അവസാനം നമ്മള്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. നിലവിലുള്ള ഡേറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും നിലവിലുള്ള വ്യത് ഫോറമ്\u200d 4. 0 വാഗ്ദാനം നല്\u200dകുന്ന ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d സമ്പാദിക്കുന്നു (റോസി- AUC =0. 9 100 പ്രസ്താവിക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ടാമ്പുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു), മാ നമ്മള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു ഫോറമ്\u200d 4.0 ന്റെ ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടേഷന്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ് യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ സമയത്ത് ആയിരക്കണക്കിന് ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ കാര', 'mt': "Bil-għadd dejjem jikber ta’ kummenti tal-utenti f’oqsma differenti, inklużi kummenti dwar il-ġurnaliżmu onlajn u s-siti elettroniċi tal-kummerċ, l-analiżi manwali tal-kontenut ta’ dawn il-kummenti ssir ta’ ħafna ħin u ta’ sfida. Madankollu, ir-riċerka wriet li l-kummenti tal-utenti fihom informazzjoni utli għal esperti differenti fid-dominji, li għalhekk huwa ta’ valur li jinstabu u jintużaw. Dan id-dokument jintroduċi Forum 4.0, qafas b’sors miftuħ biex janalizza, aggrega u viżwalizza l-kummenti tal-utenti bbażati fuq tikketti definiti mill-esperti tad-dominju b’mod semiawtomatiku. Aħna nuru l-applikabbiltà tal-Forum 4.0 b’xenarji analitiċi ta’ kummenti fl-oqsma tal-ġurnaliżmu onlajn u l-ħwienet tal-applikazzjonijiet. Aħna niddeskrivu l-arkitettura sottostanti tal-kontenituri, inkluż l-interfaċċja tal-utent ibbażata fuq l-internet, il-komponent tat-tagħlim tal-magni, u l-maniġer tal-kompiti għal kompiti li jieħdu ż-żmien. Fl-aħħar nett nagħmlu esperimenti ta' tagħlim bil-magni b'annotazzjonijiet simulati u strateġiji differenti ta' teħid ta' kampjuni fuq settijiet ta' dejta eżistenti miż-żewġ oqsma biex jevalwaw il-prestazzjoni tal-Forum 4.0. Il-Forum 4.0 jikseb riżultati promettenti ta’ klassifikazzjoni (ROC-AUC  0.9 b’100 kampjun annotat), bl-użu ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet ibbażati fuq it-trasformatur b’mudell ta’ rigressjoni loġistika ħafif. Aħna nistpjegaw kif l-arkitettura tal-Forum 4.0 hija applikabbli għal miljuni ta' kummenti tal-utenti f'ħin reali, iżda bi spejjeż ta' taħriġ u klassifikazzjoni fattibbli.", 'pl': 'Wraz z rosnącą liczbą komentarzy użytkowników w różnych dziedzinach, w tym komentarzy na stronach internetowych dziennikarskich i e-commerce, ręczna analiza treści tych komentarzy staje się czasochłonna i wymagająca. Badania wykazały jednak, że komentarze użytkowników zawierają przydatne informacje dla różnych ekspertów domen, które warto zatem znaleźć i wykorzystać. W artykule przedstawiono Forum 4.0, framework open source służący do półautomatycznej analizy, agregowania i wizualizacji komentarzy użytkowników w oparciu o etykiety zdefiniowane przez ekspertów domeny. Pokazujemy zastosowanie Forum 4.0 ze scenariuszami analizy komentarzy w dziedzinie dziennikarstwa internetowego i sklepów z aplikacjami. Przedstawiamy podstawową architekturę kontenerów, w tym interfejs użytkownika, komponent uczenia maszynowego i menedżera zadań dla czasochłonnych zadań. W końcu przeprowadzamy eksperymenty uczenia maszynowego z symulowanymi adnotacjami i różnymi strategiami próbkowania na istniejących zbiorach danych z obu domen w celu oceny wydajności Forum 4.0. Forum 4.0 osiąga obiecujące wyniki klasyfikacji (ROC-AUC 0.9 z 100 adnotacyjnymi próbkami), wykorzystując osadzenia oparte na transformatorach z lekkim modelem regresji logistycznej. Wyjaśniamy, w jaki sposób architektura Forum 4.0 ma zastosowanie do milionów komentarzy użytkowników w czasie rzeczywistym, a jednocześnie przy wykonalnych kosztach szkolenia i klasyfikacji.', 'ro': 'Odată cu numărul tot mai mare de comentarii ale utilizatorilor în diverse domenii, inclusiv comentarii privind jurnalismul online și site-urile de comerț electronic, analiza manuală a conținutului acestor comentarii devine consumatoare de timp și provocatoare. Cu toate acestea, cercetările au arătat că comentariile utilizatorilor conțin informații utile pentru diferiți experți în domeniu, care merită astfel găsite și utilizate. Această lucrare introduce Forum 4.0, un cadru open-source pentru analiza, agregarea și vizualizarea semi-automată a comentariilor utilizatorilor pe baza etichetelor definite de experții în domeniu. Demonstrăm aplicabilitatea Forumului 4.0 cu scenarii de analiză a comentariilor în domeniile jurnalismului online și magazinelor de aplicații. Conținem arhitectura containerelor de bază, inclusiv interfața de utilizator bazată pe web, componenta de învățare automată și managerul de sarcini pentru sarcini consumatoare de timp. În cele din urmă, efectuăm experimente de învățare automată cu adnotări simulate și strategii de eșantionare diferite pe seturi de date existente din ambele domenii pentru a evalua performanța Forumului 4.0. Forum 4.0 obține rezultate promițătoare de clasificare (ROC-ASC 0.9 cu 100 de eșantioane adnotate), utilizând încorporări bazate pe transformator cu un model de regresie logistică ușor. Explicăm modul în care arhitectura Forumului 4.0 este aplicabilă pentru milioane de comentarii ale utilizatorilor în timp real, dar la costuri fezabile de formare și clasificare.', 'no': 'Med det aukande antallet brukarappmerkingar i ulike domene, inkludert kommentarar om nettverksnettstader og e-kommerksnettstader, vil handhaldsanalysen av innhaldet av desse kommentarane bli bruka og vanskeleg. Forskning viste imidlertid at brukarskommentarar inneheld nyttig informasjon for ulike domeneekspertar, som derfor er verd å finna og bruka. Denne papiret introduserer Forum 4.0, eit opna kjelderammeverk for å halve-automatisk analysera, kopla og visualisera brukarkommentarar basert på etikettar definert av domeneekspertar. Vi demonstrerer tilgjengeligheten til Forum 4.0 med kommentarar analytiske scenarioar i domene for nettjournalism og programlagerer. Vi overskriver den underliggende kontenerarkitekturen, inkludert nettbasert brukargrensesnitt, maskinelæringskomponenten, og oppgåvehandsamaren for oppgåver som brukar tidspunkt. Vi utfører til slutt maskinelæringseksperimenter med simulerte notasjonar og ulike samplingsstrategiar på eksisterande datasett frå begge domene for å evaluera utviklinga av Forum 4.0. Forum 4.0 når det gjer promiserande klassifikasjonsfultar (ROC-AUC 0,9 med 100 merke prøver), brukar transformeringsbaserte innbygging med ein lett logistisk regresjonsmodul. Vi forklarer korleis arkitekturen for Forum 4.0 er tilgjengeleg for millioner av brukarar kommentarar i verkeleg tid, men ved tilgjengelege opplæring og klassifikasjonskost.', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчийн тодорхойлолтуудыг олон хэсэгт нэмэгдүүлж, онлайн сэтгүүлч болон эл-худалдааны вебсайтуудын тухай илтгэл тайлбаруудын хэмжээний талаар, эдгээр сэтгэл зүйлсийн гар дүгнэлт нь цаг хугацаанд хэрэглэж Гэхдээ судалгаагаар хэрэглэгчийн комментарүүд олох, хэрэглэх үнэ цэнэтэй мэдээллийг олох болон хэрэглэх хэрэгтэй гэдгийг харуулсан. Энэ цаас 4.0-г нээлттэй эх үүсвэртэй хэлбэрээр автоматаар шинжилгээ, нийлүүлэх, хэрэглэгчийн тэмдэглэгчид домагийн мэргэжилтнүүдийн тодорхойлогдсон жагсаалтыг харуулах боломжтой. Бид 4.0 Форумын хэрэгжүүлэлтийг онлайн сэтгүүлч болон апп дэлгүүрийн дотор шинжилгээний шинжилгээний хувилбаруудыг харуулж байна. Бид веб-based хэрэглэгчийн интерфейс, машин суралцах компонент болон цаг ашиглах ажлын менеджерын суурь барилгыг тайлбарлаж байна. Эцэст нь бид машин суралцах туршилтуудыг 4.0-ын Форумын үйл ажиллагааг үнэлэхэд хоёр хэсэгт байгаа өгөгдлийн сангийн шинж тэмдэглэх стратегийг дамжуулсан. 4.0 форум нь амлалтай хуваалцааны үр дүнг (ROC-AUC 0.9, 100 анзаарагдсан жишээлүүдтэй) ашигладаг. Бид Форум 4.0-ын архитектур хэрхэн бодит цаг үед сая сая хэрэглэгчийн тайлбаруудыг хэрхэн хэрэглэгддэг талаар тайлбарлаж байна. Гэхдээ боломжтой сургалт болон хуваалтын үнэ цэнэтэй.', 'sr': 'Sa povećanjem broja komentara korisnika u različitim domenama, uključujući komentare o internetskom novinarstvu i e-trgovinskim sajtovima, manualna analiza sadržaja tih komentara postaje potrošnja vremena i izazovna. Međutim, istraživanje pokazalo je da komentari korisnika sadrže korisne informacije za različite stručnjace domena, koje stoga vrijedi pronalaženje i iskoristiti. Ovaj papir predstavlja Forum 4.0, okvir otvorenog izvora za polu-automatski analiziranje, aggregaciju i vizualizaciju komentara korisnika na temelju etiketa definisanih od stručnjaka domena. Pokazujemo primjenu Foruma 4.0 sa komentarima analitičkih scenarija u domenu internetskih trgovina novinarstva i aplikacija. Nalazimo temeljnu arhitekturu kontejnera, uključujući internetski interfejs korisnika, komponent učenja mašine i menadžer zadataka za potrošenje vremena. Konačno provodimo eksperimente za učenje strojeva sa simuliranim annotacijom i različitim strategijama za uzorke na postojećim setima podataka iz oba domena da procenimo učinkovitost Foruma 4.0. Forum 4.0 postiže obećavajuće rezultate klasifikacije (ROC-AUC 0,9 sa 100 annotiranih uzorka), koristeći integracije na transformatoru sa modelom logističke regresije. Objašnjavamo kako je arhitektura Foruma 4.0 primjenjiva za milione komentara korisnika u realnom vremenu, ali na mogućim troškovima obuke i klasifikacije.', 'sv': 'Med det ökande antalet användarkommentarer inom olika områden, inklusive kommentarer på nätjournalistik och e-handelswebbplatser, blir den manuella innehållsanalysen av dessa kommentarer tidskrävande och utmanande. Forskning visade dock att användarkommentarer innehåller användbar information för olika domänexperter, vilket därför är värt att hitta och använda. Denna uppsats introducerar Forum 4.0, ett ramverk med öppen källkod för att semi-automatiskt analysera, aggregera och visualisera användarkommentarer baserat på etiketter definierade av domänexperter. Vi demonstrerar användbarheten av Forum 4.0 med kommentarsanalysscenarier inom domänerna online journalistik och appbutiker. Vi beskriver den underliggande containerarkitekturen, inklusive det webbaserade användargränssnittet, maskininlärningskomponenten och uppgiftshanteraren för tidskrävande uppgifter. Slutligen genomför vi maskininlärningsexperiment med simulerade anteckningar och olika samplingsstrategier på befintliga datauppsättningar från båda domänerna för att utvärdera Forum 4.0:s prestanda. Forum 4.0 uppnår lovande klassificeringsresultat (ROC-AUC 0.9 med 100 kommenterade prover), med hjälp av transformatorbaserade inbäddningar med en lätt logistisk regressionsmodell. Vi förklarar hur Forum 4.0:s arkitektur är tillämplig för miljontals användarkommentarer i realtid, men till genomförbara utbildnings- och klassificeringskostnader.', 'si': 'විවිදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනකය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනකරුවන් සඳහා විවිදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනකරුවන් සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනකරුවන් සඳහා විවිදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනකරුවන නමුත්, පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයේ සලකුණු තොරතුරු වෙනස් ඩොමේන් වි මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරවෘත 4.0 විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක්, ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්ලේෂණය, සම්පූර්ණය, සහ ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිකරුවක් ලේ අපි ප්\u200dරදර්ශනය කරන්නේ ෆෝරුම් 4.0 විශ්ලේෂක සීනාරියෝ එක්ක අන්ලයින් ජාර්නලිස් සහ ඇප්ලික් සංකේතයේ දේමින අපි පිළිබඳ පිළිබඳ කැන්ටර් ස්ථාපනය, වෙබ් අධාරිත පාවිච්චි අන්තර්ජනය, මැෂින් ඉගෙන ගන්න අංකය, සහ අපි අන්තිමේදී යන්ත්\u200dරය ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා සිමුල් කරපු ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ වෙනස් සැම්ප්ලින් සැටීම් සඳහා තියෙන්න තැන 4.0 ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා (ROC-AUC  0.9 with 100 note samples), ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200d අපි පැහැදිලි කරනවා 4.0 ගේ ස්ථාපනය කොහොමද ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විශ්වාස කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනකයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනකයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනකයේ මිලි', 'so': 'Markii commentarada isticmaalayaasha ku qoran meelaha kala duduwan, kuwaas oo ku qoran commentarada shabakadda diiwaangelinta iyo internetka ganacsiga ah, baaritaanka waxyaabaha ay ku qoran yihiin waxyaabaha dhaqaalaha ah e e kommentahaas wuxuu noqdaa wakhti-isticmaalka iyo dhibaatooyin. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxbarashadu waxay muuqatay in commentarada isticmaalayaashu ay ku jiraan macluumaad faa’iido leh oo ay leedahay khabiir deegaanka kala duduwan, taas oo ay u istaahilaan helitaanka iyo isticmaalidda. Kanu warqaddaas wuxuu soo bandhigaa Forum 4.0, kaas oo ah frame furan oo ay u sawiraan, si automatic ah u analyeyso, aggregato, oo ay u fiiriyaan commentarada isticmaalayaasha oo ku saleysan calaamado ay yaqaaneen xerada domain. Waxaynu muujinnaa codsiga Forum 4.0 oo ku qoran aragtida kalluumeysiga ee internetka diiwaangelinta iyo dukaamaha app-yada. Waxaynu qornaa taariikhda hoose ee kaynta ah, kuwaas oo ah Interfaca isticmaalaha ee internetka, qeybta waxbarashada machineenka iyo maamulka shaqada ee shaqada wakhtiga la isticmaalayo. Ugu dambaysta waxaan sameynaa imtixaanka waxbarashada mashiinka oo la mid dhigay qalabka tusaalayaasha kala duduwan oo ku saabsan sawirada labada degmooyinka si aan uga qiimeyno tababarka 4.0. Forum 4.0 wuxuu heli karaa fasalka loo ballanqaaday (ROC-AUC =0.9 with 100 samooyin annotated), wuxuu isticmaali karaa qalabka lagu beddelo oo ku qorayo model xisaab fudud. Waxaynu caddaynaynaa sida dhismaha Forum 4.0 loo isticmaalayo millionka commentarada isticmaalayaasha waqtiga hore, laakiin kharashka waxbarashada iyo fasaxa ee suurtagal ah.', 'ta': 'பல்வேறு களங்களில் பயனர் குறிப்புகளின் எண்ணிக்கையில், இணைய பத்திரிகையில் மற்றும் மின்னஞ்சல் இணையகங்களில் குறிப்புகள் உள்ளன, இந்த குறிப்புகளி ஆயினும், ஆராய்ச்சி காட்டினால் பயனர் குறிப்புகள் வேறு களம் அறிவிப்புகளுக்கு பயனுள்ள தகவல் இருக்கிறது, அதனால் கண்டு This paper introduces Forum 4. 0, an open- source frame to semi- automatically analyze, aggregate and visualize user comments based on labels. நாங்கள் போர்ம் 4. 0 பயன்பாட்டை காட்டுகிறோம் மற்றும் பயன்பாட்டு செயல்பாடுகளின் களங்களில் குறிப்புகள் ஆராய்வு காட்சிகள நாம் கீழே உள்ள கொண்ட பொறியின் கட்டுப்பாட்டை வெளிவரிசையாக்குகிறோம், வலைப்படையில் உள்ள பயனர் இடைமுகப்பு, இயந்திரம் கற்றல் பொருள், மற கடைசியாக நாம் இயந்திரம் கற்றுக்கொள்ள சோதனைகளை செயல்படுத்துகிறோம் போன்ற அறிவிப்புகள் மற்றும் வேறு மாதிரி முடிவுகள் இருந்து இருந்த Forum 4. 0 வாக்களிக்கப்படும் வகுப்பு முடிவுகளை பெறுகிறது (ROC- AUC =0. 9 மற்றும் 100 அறிவிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகள்) மாற்று அடிப்படையில் உள்ள பொருள்களை பயன்படுத்து நாம் விளக்குகிறோம் எப்படி ஃபோர்ம் 4.0 இன் கட்டுப்பாடு மில்லியன் பயனர் குறிப்புகளுக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது என்பதை எப்படி இருக்க', 'ur': 'مختلف ڈومین میں کارساز کی تعداد زیادہ بڑھی ہوتی ہے، آنلاین جورنیسم اور e-commerce ویب سایٹوں کی توضیح بھی شامل ہوتی ہے، ان توضیح کے مطابق مصنوعی توضیح کے مطابق وقت مصرف اور مشکل ہوتی ہے. However, research showed that user comments contain useful information for different domain experts, which is thus worth finding and utilizing. This paper introduces Forum 4.0, an open-source framework for semi-automatically analyze, aggregate, and visualize user comments based on labels defined by domain experts. ہم فورمن 4.0 کی کاربردی کو دکھاتے ہیں کہ آنلاین جورنیسم اور اپ زغانوں کے دامنوں میں ٹوکیٹیک سناریوں کے ساتھ ٹوکیٹ سناریوں کے ساتھ۔ ہم نے ویب-بنیاد یوسٹر انٹرنیفس، ماشین یادگیری رقم، اور تایمٹ مصرف کرنے کے لئے تابع مدیر کو روشن کر دیا ہے. ہم آخر میں مشین کی تعلیم کی آزمائش کررہے ہیں جو سائل کی آزمائش اور مختلف سامبلینگ استراتژیکوں کے ساتھ موجود ڈیٹ سٹ کے دونوں ڈومین سے فرموم 4.0 کی عملکرد کا ارزش کرنا چاہتے ہیں. فورمن 4.0 کا وعدہ کرتا ہے کلاسپیٹ نتیجے (ROC-AUC °0.9 °100 نمونے کے ساتھ) حاصل کرتا ہے، تغییر پھیلانے پر بنیاد رکھا ہوا ایمبڈینگ کے استعمال کرتا ہے ایک ہلکتی لوژیک ریگرس موڈل کے ساتھ۔ ہم کھول دیتے ہیں کہ فیروم 4.0 کی معماری کس طرح واقعی زمانہ میں ملیون کارساز کی توضیح کے لئے لازم ہے، لیکن قابل تعلیم اور کلاسیفون کے قیمت پر۔', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Lekin, taʼminot boshqa domen ekspertlariga foydalanuvchilar maʼlumotiga ega bo'ladi. Bu sababdan foydalanish va foydalanish kerak. Name Biz 4.0 Forum dasturining qoʻllanmagan izohlar analytik scenariyatlarini Online roʻyxat va app buttonlar davlatida koʻrsatimiz. We outline the underlying container architecture, including the web-based user interface, the machine learning component, and the task manager for time-consuming tasks.  Biz oxirida mashina o'rganish imtiyozlarini o'rganish imtiyozlari bilan o'xshash taʼminlovchilar va bu ikkita domenadan mavjud maʼlumotlar tizimini qiymatish uchun boshqa tugmalarni bajaramiz. Name Biz Forum 4.0 tashkilotlari millionlab foydalanuvchi izohlari haqida qanday qo'llaniladi, ammo mumkin trening va tafsilotning qiymatida.", 'vi': 'Với số lượng người dùng nhận xét ngày càng nhiều về các lĩnh vực khác nhau, bao gồm các bình luận về trang web báo chí trực tuyến và thương mại qua mạng, phân tích nội dung bằng tay của các nhận xét này trở nên tốn thời gian và đầy thử thách. Tuy nhiên, nghiên cứu cho thấy các nhận xét của người dùng chứa thông tin hữu ích cho các chuyên gia lãnh thổ khác nhau, và cũng đáng tìm kiếm và tận dụng. Tờ giấy này giới thiệu Forum 4.0, một cơ sở nguồn mở để phân tích, tổng hợp và hình dung các nhận xét người dùng dựa trên các nhãn được xác định bởi chuyên gia miền. Chúng tôi đã xác định được quy tắc của Forum 4.0 với các giả lập phân tích xuất sắc trong các lĩnh vực báo chí trực tuyến và các cửa hàng ứng dụng. Chúng tôi mô tả các kiến trúc chứa bên dưới, bao gồm các giao diện người dùng dựa trên mạng, các thành phần học tạo máy, và quản lý việc tốn thời gian. Chúng tôi cuối cùng tiến hành các thí nghiệm về học máy với các chú thích mô phỏng và các chiến lược mẫu khác nhau trên các tập tin tồn tại từ hai miền để đánh giá khả năng của Forum 4.0. Diễn đàn 4.0 đạt được kết quả phân hạng hứa hẹn (ROC-AUC 0.9 với hàng trăm mẫu ghi chú), nhờ có sự nhúng tay từ bộ phận chuyển hóa với mô hình Hồi phục nhẹ. Chúng tôi giải thích cách kiến trúc của Forum 4.0 được áp dụng cho hàng triệu câu trả lời người dùng trong thời gian thực, nhưng với chi phí đào tạo và phân loại có thể.', 'nl': "Met het toenemende aantal gebruikerscommentaren in diverse domeinen, waaronder commentaren op online journalistiek en e-commerce websites, wordt de handmatige inhoudsanalyse van deze commentaren tijdrovend en uitdagend. Onderzoek toonde echter aan dat gebruikerscommentaren nuttige informatie bevatten voor verschillende domeinexperts, die dus de moeite waard is om te vinden en te gebruiken. Dit artikel introduceert Forum 4.0, een open-source framework voor semi-automatisch analyseren, aggregeren en visualiseren van gebruikersopmerkingen op basis van labels gedefinieerd door domeinexperts. We demonstreren de toepasbaarheid van Forum 4.0 met comments analytics scenario's binnen de domeinen van online journalistiek en app stores. We schetsen de onderliggende containerarchitectuur, inclusief de webgebaseerde gebruikersinterface, de machine learning component en de taakbeheerder voor tijdrovende taken. Uiteindelijk voeren we machine learning experimenten uit met gesimuleerde annotaties en verschillende sampling strategieën op bestaande datasets uit beide domeinen om de prestaties van Forum 4.0 te evalueren. Forum 4.0 bereikt veelbelovende classificatieresultaten (ROC-AUC 0.9 met 100 geannoteerde samples), gebruikmakend van transformatorgebaseerde embeddings met een lichtgewicht logistiek regressiemodel. We leggen uit hoe Forum 4.0's architectuur toepasbaar is voor miljoenen gebruikerscommentaren in real-time, maar toch tegen haalbare trainings- en classificatiekosten.", 'da': "Med det stigende antal brugerkommentarer på forskellige områder, herunder kommentarer til online journalistik og e-handelswebsteder, bliver den manuelle indholdsanalyse af disse kommentarer tidskrævende og udfordrende. Undersøgelser viste dog, at brugerkommentarer indeholder nyttige oplysninger for forskellige domæneeksperter, som derfor er værd at finde og udnytte. Denne artikel introducerer Forum 4.0, en open source-ramme til semi-automatisk analyse, aggregere og visualisere brugerkommentarer baseret på etiketter defineret af domæneeksperter. Vi demonstrerer anvendeligheden af Forum 4.0 med kommentarsanalyse scenarier inden for domænerne online journalistik og app butikker. Vi skitserer den underliggende beholderarkitektur, herunder den webbaserede brugergrænseflade, maskinlæringskomponenten og opgavestyringen til tidskrævende opgaver. Endelig gennemfører vi maskinlæringseksperimenter med simulerede annotationer og forskellige samplingsstrategier på eksisterende datasæt fra begge domæner for at evaluere Forum 4.0's ydeevne. Forum 4.0 opnår lovende klassificeringsresultater (ROC-AUC 0.9 med 100 annoterede prøver), ved hjælp af transformer-baserede indlejringer med en letvægts logistisk regressionsmodel. Vi forklarer, hvordan Forum 4.0's arkitektur kan anvendes til millioner af brugerkommentarer i realtid, men til mulige uddannelses- og klassificeringsomkostninger.", 'id': "Dengan meningkat jumlah komentar pengguna dalam berbagai daerah, termasuk komentar pada jurnalisme online dan situs-situs e-commerce, analisis isi manual komentar ini menjadi waktu-memakan dan menantang. However, research showed that user comments contain useful information for different domain experts, which is thus worth finding and utilizing.  Kertas ini memperkenalkan Forum 4.0, sebuah rangkaian sumber terbuka untuk semi-otomatis menganalisis, agregasi, dan visualisasi komentar pengguna berdasarkan label yang didefinisikan oleh ahli domain. Kami menunjukkan aplikabilitas Forum 4.0 dengan skenario analitik komentar dalam bidang jurnalisme online dan toko aplikasi. Kami menggambarkan arsitektur kontainer yang didasarkan, termasuk antarmuka pengguna berdasarkan web, komponen belajar mesin, dan manajer tugas untuk tugas yang memakan waktu. We finally conduct machine learning experiments with simulated annotations and different sampling strategies on existing datasets from both domains to evaluate Forum 4.0's performance.  Forum 4.0 mencapai hasil klasifikasi yang berjanji (ROC-AUC  0.9 dengan 100 sampel annotasi), menggunakan penerbangan berdasarkan transformer dengan model regresi logistik ringan. Kami menjelaskan bagaimana arsitektur Forum 4.0 yang berlaku untuk jutaan komentar pengguna dalam waktu nyata, namun dengan biaya pelatihan dan klasifikasi yang mungkin.", 'bg': 'С нарастващия брой потребителски коментари в различни области, включително коментари за онлайн журналистика и уебсайтове за електронна търговия, ръчният анализ на съдържанието на тези коментари става отнемащ време и предизвикателен. Проучванията обаче показват, че потребителските коментари съдържат полезна информация за различни експерти в областта, което си струва да се намери и използва. Тази статия представя Форум 4.0, рамка с отворен код, която полуавтоматично анализира, агрегира и визуализира потребителските коментари въз основа на етикети, определени от експерти в областта. Демонстрираме приложимостта на Форум 4.0 със сценарии за анализ на коментари в областите на онлайн журналистиката и ап магазините. Ние очертаваме основната архитектура на контейнера, включително уеб-базирания потребителски интерфейс, компонента за машинно обучение и мениджъра на задачите за отнемащи време задачи. Накрая провеждаме експерименти с машинно обучение със симулирани анотации и различни стратегии за вземане на проби върху съществуващи набори от данни от двете области, за да оценим ефективността на Форум 4.0. Форум 4.0 постига обещаващи резултати за класификация (ROC-AUC 0.9 с 100 анотирани проби), използвайки вграждания на базата на трансформатори с лек логистичен регресионен модел. Обясняваме как архитектурата на Форум 4.0 е приложима за милиони потребителски коментари в реално време, но при осъществими разходи за обучение и класификация.', 'de': 'Mit der steigenden Anzahl von Nutzerkommentaren in verschiedenen Bereichen, einschließlich Kommentaren auf Online-Journalismus und E-Commerce-Websites, wird die manuelle Inhaltsanalyse dieser Kommentare zeitaufwändig und herausfordernd. Untersuchungen haben jedoch gezeigt, dass Nutzerkommentare nützliche Informationen für verschiedene Domain-Experten enthalten, die es wert sind, zu finden und zu nutzen. Dieses Papier stellt Forum 4.0 vor, ein Open-Source-Framework, das Benutzerkommentare halbautomatisch analysiert, aggregiert und visualisiert, basierend auf Labels, die von Domain-Experten definiert wurden. Wir demonstrieren die Anwendbarkeit von Forum 4.0 mit Kommentaranalyseszenarien in den Bereichen Online-Journalismus und App Stores. Wir skizzieren die zugrunde liegende Containerarchitektur einschließlich der webbasierten Benutzeroberfläche, der Machine Learning Komponente und dem Task Manager für zeitaufwändige Aufgaben. Abschließend führen wir maschinelles Lernen mit simulierten Annotationen und verschiedenen Sampling-Strategien an bestehenden Datensätzen aus beiden Domänen durch, um die Leistung des Forum 4.0 zu bewerten. Forum 4.0 erzielt vielversprechende Klassifizierungsergebnisse (ROC-AUC 0.9 mit 100 annotierten Proben) unter Verwendung transformatorbasierter Einbettungen mit einem leichten logistischen Regressionsmodell. Wir erklären, wie die Architektur von Forum 4.0 für Millionen von Benutzerkommentaren in Echtzeit und dennoch zu vertretbaren Schulungs- und Klassifizierungskosten anwendbar ist.', 'ko': '다양한 분야의 사용자 평론(온라인 뉴스와 전자상거래 사이트의 평론 포함) 수가 증가함에 따라 수동으로 이 평론의 내용을 분석하는 것은 시간이 소모되고 도전적이다.그러나 사용자 평론은 다양한 분야의 전문가에게 유용한 정보를 포함하고 있기 때문에 찾고 활용할 가치가 있다는 연구결과가 나왔다.본고는Forum4.0을 소개했는데 이것은 분야 전문가가 정의한 라벨에 따라 반자동 분석, 집합과 시각화된 사용자 평론을 할 수 있는 기원 구조이다.우리는 온라인 뉴스와 앱스토어 분야 내의 평론 분석 장면을 통해 포럼 4.0의 적용성을 보여 주었다.웹 기반의 사용자 인터페이스, 기계 학습 구성 요소, 시간 소모 작업에 사용되는 작업 관리자를 포함한 기본 용기 체계 구조를 개술했다.마지막으로 우리는 두 분야의 기존 데이터 집합에서 아날로그 주석과 서로 다른 샘플링 전략을 사용하여 기계 학습 실험을 실시하여 Forum4.0의 성능을 평가한다.Forum 4.0은 변압기 기반 내장과 경량급 논리 회귀 모델을 활용해 유망한 분류 결과(ROC-AUC 0.9, 주석 샘플 100개)를 얻었다.Forum 4.0 아키텍처가 가능한 교육 및 분류 비용으로 수백만 명의 사용자에게 실시간으로 적용되는 방법에 대해 설명했습니다.', 'fa': 'با افزایش تعداد توضیح\u200cهای کاربر در مجموعه\u200cهای مختلف، شامل توضیح\u200cها در مورد روزنامه\u200cگذاری آنلاین و وب\u200cسایت\u200cهای e-commerce، تحلیل محتوای دستی از این توضیح\u200cها زمان\u200cconsumption و سخت\u200cگیری می\u200cشود. با این حال، تحقیقات نشان داد که توضیح\u200cهای کاربر برای متخصص دانشجویان مختلف اطلاعات مفید دارند، که به همین دلیل ارزش پیدا کردن و استفاده کردن است. این کاغذ فرم 4.0 را معرفی می\u200cکند، یک چهارچوب منبع باز برای تحلیل، جمع و تصویر کردن توضیح کاربر بر بر برچسب\u200cها که توسط متخصص دانشجویان دامین تعریف شده\u200cاند. ما کاربردی فورم 4.0 را نشان می\u200cدهیم با سیناریو تحلیل\u200cکننده\u200cها در دامنهای فروشگاه\u200cهای خبرنگاری و کاربرد آنلاین. ما معماری کانتینر پایه\u200cای را مشخص می\u200cکنیم، شامل interface ی کاربر بر وب، بخش یادگیری ماشین، و مدیر کار برای کار\u200cهای مصرف زمان. بالاخره ما آزمایشات یادگیری ماشین را با آزمایشات شبیه\u200cسازی و استراتژی\u200cهای نمونه\u200cسازی مختلف در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای موجود از هر دو دامنه انجام می\u200cدهیم تا عملکرد فورم 4.0 را ارزیابی کنیم. Forum 4.0 achieves promising classification results (ROC-AUC 0.9 with 100 annotated samples), using transformer-based embeddings with a light logistic regression model. ما توضیح می\u200cدهیم که چگونه معماری فورم ۴.۰ برای میلیون\u200cها توضیح\u200cهای کاربر در زمان واقعی قابل استفاده می\u200cشود، ولی با هزینه\u200cهای آموزش و برنامه\u200cبندی قابل انجام می\u200cشود.', 'sw': 'Kwa kuongezeka kwa maoni ya watumiaji katika maeneo mbalimbali, ikiwa ni pamoja na maoni kwenye tovuti za uandishi wa habari na biashara za mtandaoni, uchambuzi wa maudhui ya mikononi ya maoni haya yanakuwa matumizi na changamoto. Hata hivyo, utafiti ulionyesha kuwa maoni ya mtumiaji ina taarifa yenye manufaa kwa wataalam tofauti wa ndani, ambayo kwa hiyo inastahili kupata na kutumia. Gazeti hili linaonyesha Jukwaa 4.0, mfumo wa vyanzo huru wa uchambuzi, uchunguzi, na kuonyesha maoni ya watumiaji kwa kutumia mabango yanayoelezwa na wataalam wa ndani. Tunaonyesha matumizi ya Jukwaa 4.0 kwa maoni ya uchambuzi katika maeneo ya uandishi wa habari na maduka ya programu ya mtandaoni. Tunajaribu ujenzi wa ndani, ikiwa ni pamoja na mtandao wa mtumiaji wa mtandaoni, vifaa vya kujifunza mashine, na mwendeshaji wa kazi za matumizi ya muda. Hatimaye tunafanya majaribio ya kujifunza mashine kwa matangazo yanayofanana na mikakati mbalimbali ya sampuli kuhusu seti za data zinazopo kwenye maeneo mawili ili ili kutathmini utendaji wa Jukwaa 4.0. Jukwaa la 4.0 linafanikiwa matokeo yanayoahidiwa kutangaza fasihi (ROC-AUC =0.9 na sampuli 100 zilizotajwa), kwa kutumia mabadiliko yanayotokana na mabadiliko yenye modeli ya kudhibiti uzito mzito. Tunaelezea jinsi ujenzi wa Forum 4.0 unavyotumika kwa mamilioni ya maoni ya watumiaji kwa wakati halisi, lakini kwa gharama za mafunzo na usambazaji.', 'tr': "Ullançylaryň näçe sahypalarda köp terjimeler bar, online žurnalistiýa we e-komersiýa websitelerinde hatlary bilen bu terjimeleriň elipbi maksadynyň analysi wagtyň ahyry bolup we çözgütli bolar. However, research showed that users comments contain useful information for different domain experts, which is thus worth finding and using. Bu kagyz Forum 4.0, awtomatik taýýarlanmak, toplamak, we domena uzmanlary tarapyndan taniş etiketlere daýan ýan etiketlere görkezilýär. Biz 4.0 Forum'yň uygulamalaryny internet žurnalistik we uygulama dükkanlarynyň sahypalarynda terjime analytiki senaryo bilen görkezip berýäris. Web tabanly ulançylar interface, makine öwrenmäge komponenti we zamany ulanylar görevleri üçin gören meýdançasyny tassyklaýarys. Ahyrsoňy biz maşynyň öwrenmek deneylerini simulatik duýdurmalar we bar sahypalaryň 4.0-nyň etkinleşigini deňleştirmek üçin meňzeş sahypalarda örän örnek çykmak stratejikleri bilen etdik. Forum 4.0 söz klasifikasyon netijesini ýetip bilýär Biz Forumyň 4.0 arhitekturyýasynyň milliyonlaryň hakyky wagtda nähili ulanyp bilýändigini düşündirýäris, ýöne olaryň bilim we klasifikasyýanyň bahalarynda.", 'af': "Met die vergroei aantal gebruiker kommentaar in verskeie domeine, insluitend kommentaar oor online journalism en e-commerce webstede, word die hand-inhoud analiseer van hierdie kommentaar tyd-verbruik en moeilik. Maar ondersoek het gewys dat gebruiker kommentaar gebruik gebruiklike inligting bevat vir verskillende domein eksperte, wat so waardeur om te vind en te gebruik. Hierdie papier introduseer Forum 4.0, 'n oop-bron raamwerk na semi-automaties analiseer, aggregate en visualiseer gebruiker kommentaar gebaseer op etikette gedefinieer deur domein eksperte. Ons wys die toepassing van Forum 4.0 met kommentaar analitiese scenarios binne die domene van online journalism en app stoorplekke. Ons outline the underlying container architecture, including the web-based user interface, the machine learning component, and the task manager for time-consuming tasks. Ons het eindelik masjien leer eksperimente gedoen met simuleerde notasies en verskillende sampling s strategies op bestaande datastelle van beide domeine om Forum 4.0 se prestasie te evalueer. Forum 4. 0 bereik beloftende klassifikasie resultate (Roc- AUC  0. 9 met 100 notateerde voorbeelde), gebruik van transformer- gebaseerde inbêding met 'n liggewig logistike regresie model. Ons verduidelik hoe die Forum 4.0 se arkitektuur toewenbaar is vir miljoene gebruikerkommentaar in regtig tyd, maar met feilige onderwerp en klasifikasie koste.", 'hr': 'Uz povećanje broja komentara korisnika u različitim domenama, uključujući komentare o internetskom novinarstvu i e-trgovinskim internetskim stranicama, manualna analiza sadržaja tih komentara postaje potrošnja vremena i izazovna. Međutim, istraživanje pokazalo je da komentari korisnika sadrže korisne informacije za različite stručnjace domena, što stoga vrijedi pronaći i iskoristiti. Ovaj papir predstavlja Forum 4.0, okvir otvorenog izvora za polu-automatski analiziranje, skupljanje i vizualizaciju komentara korisnika na temelju etiketa definiranih od stručnjaka domena. Pokazujemo primjenu Foruma 4.0 s komentarima analitičkih scenarija u domenu internetskih trgovina novinarstva i aplikacija. Objašnjavamo temeljnu arhitekturu kontejnera, uključujući internetski interfejs korisnika, komponent učenja strojeva, i menadžer zadataka za zadatke potrošnje vremena. Konačno provodimo eksperimente za učenje strojeva sa simuliranim annotacijom i različitim strategijama za uzorak uzorka na postojećim setima podataka iz oba domena kako bi procijenili učinkovitost Foruma 4.0. Forum 4.0 postiže obećavajuće rezultate klasifikacije (ROC-AUC “ 0,9 ” s 100 annotiranih uzorka), koristeći integracije na transformatoru s modelom logističke regresije lagane težine. Objašnjavamo kako je arhitektura Foruma 4.0 primjenjiva za milijune komentara korisnika u realnom vremenu, ali na mogućim troškovima obuke i klasifikacije.', 'sq': "Me numrin në rritje të komenteve të përdoruesve në fusha të ndryshme, duke përfshirë komentet mbi gazetarinë në internet dhe faqet e internetit të tregtisë elektronike, analiza manuale e përmbajtjeve të këtyre komenteve bëhet e vështirë dhe e tepruar. Megjithatë, kërkimi tregoi se komentet e përdoruesve përmbajnë informacion të dobishëm për ekspertët e ndryshëm të fushës, që kështu vlen të gjejnë dhe të përdorin. Ky dokument paraqet Forum 4.0, një kuadër me burim të hapur për të analizuar, aggreguar dhe vizualizuar komentet e përdoruesve bazuar në etiketat e përcaktuara nga ekspertët e fushës. Ne demonstrojmë aplikabilitetin e Forumit 4.0 me skenarë analitike komentesh brenda domeneve të gazetarisë online dhe dyqaneve të aplikacioneve. Ne përshkruajmë arkitekturën themelore të kontejnerit, duke përfshirë interfaqen e përdoruesit me bazë në internet, komponentin e mësimit të makinave dhe menaxherin e detyrave për detyrat që konsumojnë kohë. Ne më në fund kryejmë eksperimente mësimi makinash me anotacione të simuluara dhe strategji të ndryshme kampionash mbi të dhënat ekzistuese nga të dy fushat për të vlerësuar performancën e Forumit 4.0. Forum 4.0 achieves promising classification results (ROC-AUC  0.9 with 100 annotated samples), utilizing transformer-based embeddings with a lightweight logistic regression model.  We explain how Forum 4.0's architecture is applicable for millions of user comments in real-time, yet at feasible training and classification costs.", 'am': "በተለያዩ አካባቢዎች ውስጥ በተጨማሪው የጦማሪያዎች እና የኢሜይል ጋዜጠኛ ድረአምቦች ውስጥ በተጨማሪው የአጠቃሚ አስተያየት፣ የዚህ ትርጓሜዎች የጥያቄ ትርጉም ጊዜን ለመጠቀም እና አቃላይነት ይሆናል፡፡ ነገር ግን ትምህርት የተጠቃሚ አስተያየት ለሌላ ዶሜን አዋቂዎች የሚጠቅመው መረጃዎች እንዲኖር ያሳየዋል፡፡ ይህ ገጽ ፎርማት 4.0፣ የዶሜን አዋቂዎች በጽሑፎች ላይ በተመሳሳይ፣ በራሱ ማስታወቂያ፣ ማስታወቂያ እና የተጠቃሚ ትርጓሜዎችን የሚያሳውቅ የክፈት የክፈት ክፍተት ነው፡፡ የፎሮም 4.0 የተባለውን የመስመር ታሪክ እና የመስመር ጋዜጠኞች እና በፕሮግራም ጋዜጠቶች ውስጥ ያሉትን ድረ ገጽ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ የመድረክ ተጠቃሚዎች ማቀናጃ፣ የመሳሪያውን ትምህርት ክፍል እና የስራ ማቀናጃ መቆጣጠሪያ እናደርጋለን፡፡ We finally conduct machine learning experiments with simulated annotations and different sampling strategies on existing datasets from both domains to evaluate Forum 4.0's performance.  ፎርማት 4.0 የተስፋ ክፍተቶችን (ROC-AUC - 0.9 እና 100 ምሳሌዎች ጋር) በተስፋ የሚያደርገውን ክፍተት ማግኘት ያገኛል፡፡ የፎሮም 4.0 የመሠረተ ሥርዓት ለመሊዮን የተጠቃሚ ትርጉም እንዴት እንደሚጠቀም እናብራራለን፤ ነገር ግን በተቻለው ትምህርት እና ለመለያየት ዋጋዎች ነው፡፡", 'bn': 'বিভিন্ন ডোমেইনে ব্যবহারকারীদের সংখ্যা বাড়তে থাকার পরে, যার মধ্যে অনলাইন সাংবাদিকতা এবং ই-কমার্জেন্স ওয়েবসাইটে মন্তব্য রয়েছে, এই মন্তব্যের বিষয়বস্তু ব তবে গবেষণা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে ব্যবহারকারীর মন্তব্য বিভিন্ন ডোমেইন বিশেষজ্ঞের জন্য কার্যকর তথ্য রয়েছে, যার ফলে তারা খুঁ এই পত্রিকা ফোরাম ৪. ০, ডোমেইন বিশেষজ্ঞদের লেবেলের ভিত্তিতে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে বিশ্লেষণ, বিশ্লেষণ এবং ব্যবহারকারীদের মন্তব্য করার জন্য একটি উন্ম আমরা অনলাইন সাংবাদিকতা এবং অ্যাপ্লিকেশন দোকানের মধ্যে মন্তব্যের বিশ্লেষণের দৃশ্য দিয়ে ফোরাম ৪. আমরা ভিত্তিক ব্যবহারকারীর ইন্টারফেস, মেশিন শিক্ষা কম্পোনেন্ট এবং সময়-ভক্ত করার কাজের কাজ ম্যানেজার। শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা মেশিন শিক্ষা পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা করি বিভিন্ন পরীক্ষার মাধ্যমে বিভিন্ন ধরনের পরীক্ষা এবং বিভিন্ন ধরনের উদাহরণ কৌশলের মাধ্যম ফোরাম ৪. ০ প্রতিশ্রুতি শ্রেণীবিভাগের ফলাফল অর্জন করে (ROC-AUC =0. 9 এবং ১০০ পরীক্ষা করা নমুনা ব্যবহার করে) একটি হাল্কা বৈশিষ্ট্যিক প্রতিক্রিয়ার মডেল ব আমরা ব্যাখ্যা করছি কিভাবে ফোরাম ৪. ০ এর আর্কিটেক্টার ক্ষেত্রে কোটি লক্ষ ব্যবহারকারীর মন্তব্য প্রয়োজন, কিন্তু এখনো সম্ভব প্রশিক্ষণ ও', 'bs': 'Sa povećanjem broja komentara korisnika u različitim domenama, uključujući komentare o internetskom novinarstvu i e-trgovinskim sajtovima, manualna analiza sadržaja tih komentara postaje potrošnja vremena i izazovna. Međutim, istraživanje pokazalo je da komentari korisnika sadrže korisne informacije za različite stručnjace domena, koje stoga vrijedi pronalaženje i iskoristiti. Ovaj papir predstavlja Forum 4.0, okvir otvorenog izvora za polu-automatski analiziranje, skupljanje i vizualizaciju komentara korisnika na temelju etiketa definiranih od stručnjaka domena. Pokazujemo primjenu Foruma 4.0 sa komentarima analitičkim scenarijama u domenu internetskih novinarstva i prodavnica aplikacija. Mi objašnjavamo temeljnu arhitekturu kontejnera, uključujući internetski interfejs korisnika, komponent učenja mašine i menadžer zadataka za vrijeme potrošnje zadataka. Konačno provodimo eksperimente za učenje strojeva sa simuliranim annotacijom i različitim strategijama za uzorak uzorka na postojećim setima podataka iz oba domena za procjenu učinka Foruma 4.0. Forum 4.0 postiže obećavajuće rezultate klasifikacije (ROC-AUC 0,9 s 100 notatnih uzorka), koristeći integracije na transformatoru sa modelom logističke regresije. Objašnjavamo kako je arhitektura Foruma 4.0 primjenjiva za milijune komentara korisnika u realnom vremenu, ali na mogućim troškovima obuke i klasifikacije.', 'ca': "Amb el creixent nombre de comentaris d'usuaris en dominys diversos, incloent comentaris sobre periodisme en línia i sitis web del comerç electrònic, l'anàlisi manual del contingut d'aquests comentaris esdevé molt temps i difícil. Tot i així, la recerca va demostrar que els comentaris dels usuaris contenen informació útil per a diferents experts en dominis, que val la pena trobar i utilitzar. Aquest article introdueix el Foro 4.0, un marc de codi obert per analitzar, agregar i visualitzar els comentaris dels usuaris basats en etiquetes definides per experts en dominis. We demonstrate the applicability of Forum 4.0 with comments analytics scenarios within the domains of online journalism and app stores.  Descrivem l'arquitectura subjacente dels recipients, incloent la interfície d'usuari basada en la Web, el component d'aprenentatge de màquines i el director de tasques per tasques que consumeixen temps. Finalment fem experiments d'aprenentatge automàtic amb anotacions simulades i diferents estratègies de recolliment de mostres sobre conjunts de dades existents de ambdós dominis per avaluar el rendiment del Foro 4.0. El fòrum 4.0 aconsegueix resultats prometedors de classificació (ROC-AUC 0,9 amb 100 mostres anotates), utilitzant incorporacions basades en transformadors amb un model de regressió logística lliure. We explain how Forum 4.0's architecture is applicable for millions of user comments in real-time, yet at feasible training and classification costs.", 'az': "İnternet žurnalisti və e-ticarət sitələri barəsindəki şəkillərin müxtəlif sahələrdə istifadəçilərin sayısını artırmaq üçün, bu şəkillərin əlli məlumatı analizi vaxt istifadə edir və çətin olar. Ancaq araşdırma göstərdi ki, istifadəçilərin şəkilləri müxtəlif domena ekspertləri üçün faydalı məlumatlar barəsində, bu da tapmağa və istifadə etməyə layiqdir. Bu kağıt yarı-avtomatik analizə, toplama və domena ekspertləri tarafından tanınmış etiketlərə dayanan etiketlərə dayanan istifadəçilərin şəkillərini göstərmək üçün açıq-kaynak çerçivi 4.0 Forum'u təşkil edir. Biz 4.0 Forum'un uyğunluğunu onlayn žurnalistik və uyğunluğu dükkanlarının dəstələrində analitik senaryoları ilə göstəririk. İnternet-tabanlı istifadəçi interfejsini, makinatı öyrənmə komponenti və vaxt istifadə etmə işləri üçün çalışma müdürünü təsbiq edirik. Sonunda, hər iki domenindən, Forum 4.0 performansını değerləşdirmək üçün maşın öyrənmə təcrübələri ilə və müxtəlif məlumat çəkmə stratejiləri ilə işlədik. Forum 4.0 söz verilən klasifikasyon sonuçlarına ( ROC-AUC  0.9 100 notalı nümunələri ilə ) nail edər, transformer-based inbingləri yüngül lojik regresiya modeli ilə istifadə edər. Biz Forum 4.0 arhitekturunun necə istifadəçilərin müəyyən ediləcəyini gerçek zamanda müəyyən ediləcəyi milyonlarla istifadəçi komentərlərinin istifadə ediləcəyini açıqlayırıq.", 'hy': "Օգտագործողների մեկնաբանությունների աճող թիվը տարբեր ոլորտներում, ներառյալ մեկնաբանությունները առցանց լրատվամիջոցների և էլեկտրոնային առևտրային կայքերի մասին, այս մեկնաբանությունների ձեռավարական պարունակության վերլուծությունը դառնում է ժամանակ պահանջող և դժվար Այնուամենայնիվ, հետազոտությունները ցույց տվեցին, որ օգտագործողների մեկնաբանությունները պարունակում են օգտակար տեղեկատվություն տարբեր բնագավառների մասնագետների համար, ինչը արժե գտնել և օգտագործել: Այս աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է Ֆորմում 4.0, բաց աղբյուրի շրջանակ, որը կիսաավտոմատիկ վերլուծում է, համախմբում և տեսողացնում է օգտագործողների մեկնաբանությունները, հիմնված բնագավառի մասնագետների սահմանված պիտակների վրա: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս Ֆորմում 4.0-ի կիրառելիությունը մեկնաբանությունների վերլուծության սցենարներով առցանց լրատվամիջոցների և ծրագրերի խանութների ոլորտներում: We outline the underlying container architecture, including the web-based user interface, the machine learning component, and the task manager for time-consuming tasks.  We finally conduct machine learning experiments with simulated annotations and different sampling strategies on existing datasets from both domains to evaluate Forum 4.0's performance.  Ֆորմում 4.0 ստանում է խոստացնող դասակարգման արդյունքներ (ROC-ԱՍՔ-ն 0.9 է 100 նկարագրված նմուշների հետ), օգտագործելով վերափոխողների հիմնված ներդրումներ թեթև լոգիստիկ ռեգրեսիայի մոդելի հետ: Մենք բացատրում ենք, թե ինչպես է Ֆորմում 4.0 ճարտարապետությունը կիրառվում միլիոնավոր օգտագործողների մեկնաբանությունների համար իրական ժամանակում, սակայն իրականացնելի ուսուցման և դասակարգման արժեքների վրա:", 'et': 'Kasutajate kommentaaride arvu suurenemisega erinevates valdkondades, sealhulgas veebiajakirjanduse ja e-kaubanduse veebisaitidel, muutub nende kommentaaride käsitsi sisuanalüüs aeganõudvaks ja keeruliseks. Uuringud näitasid siiski, et kasutajate kommentaarid sisaldavad kasulikku informatsiooni erinevatele domeeniekspertidele, mis tasub seega leida ja kasutada. Käesolevas dokumendis tutvustatakse Forum 4.0, avatud lähtekoodiga raamistikku, mille abil saab poolautomaatselt analüüsida, koondada ja visualiseerida kasutajate kommentaare domeeniekspertide määratletud siltide põhjal. Näitame Forum 4.0 rakendatavust kommentaarianalüüsi stsenaariumidega veebiajakirjanduse ja rakenduspoe valdkondades. Me kirjeldame konteineri aluseks oleva arhitektuuri, sealhulgas veebipõhise kasutajaliidese, masinõppe komponendi ja aeganõudvate ülesannete ülesandehalduri. Lõpuks teostame masinõppe katseid simuleeritud annotatsioonide ja erinevate valimisstrateegiatega olemasolevate andmekogumitega mõlemast valdkonnast, et hinnata Forum 4.0 jõudlust. Forum 4.0 saavutab paljulubavad klassifitseerimistulemused (ROC-AUC 0,9 100 märgitud prooviga), kasutades trafopõhiseid manustamisi kerge logistilise regressiooni mudeliga. Selgitame, kuidas Forum 4.0 arhitektuur on rakendatav miljonite kasutajate kommentaaride jaoks reaalajas, kuid teostatavate koolitus- ja klassifitseerimiskuludega.', 'fi': 'Käyttäjien kommenttien määrän lisääntyessä eri toimialoilla, kuten verkkojournalismin ja verkkokaupan verkkosivustoilla, näiden kommenttien manuaalisesta sisällönanalyysistä tulee aikaa vievää ja haastavaa. Tutkimukset osoittivat kuitenkin, että käyttäjäkommentit sisältävät hyödyllistä tietoa eri toimialueiden asiantuntijoille, mikä kannattaa siis löytää ja hyödyntää. Tämä artikkeli esittelee Forum 4.0:n, avoimen lähdekoodin kehyksen, jonka avulla voidaan puoliautomaattisesti analysoida, koota ja visualisoida käyttäjien kommentteja toimialueen asiantuntijoiden määrittelemien tunnisteiden perusteella. Esittelemme Forum 4.0:n soveltuvuutta kommentointianalytiikkaskenaarioiden avulla verkkojournalismin ja sovelluskauppojen toimialueilla. Esittelemme konttiarkkitehtuurin, kuten verkkopohjaisen käyttöliittymän, koneoppimiskomponentin ja aikaa vievien tehtävien tehtävähallinnan. Lopuksi suoritamme koneoppimiskokeita simuloiduilla annotoineilla ja erilaisilla näytteenottostrategioilla olemassa olevilla aineistoilla molemmilta toimialoilta arvioidaksemme Forum 4.0:n suorituskykyä. Forum 4.0 saavuttaa lupaavia luokitustuloksia (ROC-AUC 0,9 100 merkinnällä varustettua näytettä) käyttäen muuntajapohjaisia upotuksia kevyellä logistisella regressiomallilla. Selitämme, miten Forum 4.0:n arkkitehtuuri soveltuu miljooniin käyttäjäkommentteihin reaaliaikaisesti, mutta toteuttamiskelpoisilla koulutus- ja luokittelukustannuksilla.', 'cs': 'S rostoucím počtem uživatelských komentářů v různých doménách, včetně komentářů na online žurnalistice a webových stránkách e-commerce, se ruční obsahová analýza těchto komentářů stává časově náročná a náročná. Výzkum však ukázal, že uživatelské komentáře obsahují užitečné informace pro různé odborníky v oblasti domény, což stojí za nalezení a využití. Tento článek představuje Forum 4.0, open-source framework pro poloautomatickou analýzu, agregování a vizualizaci uživatelských komentářů na základě štítků definovaných odborníky v oblasti domény. Demonstrujeme použitelnost fóra 4.0 se scénáři analýzy komentářů v oblasti online žurnalistiky a app stores. Nastíníme základní architekturu kontejneru, včetně webového uživatelského rozhraní, komponenty strojového učení a správce úloh pro časově náročné úkoly. Nakonec provádíme experimenty strojového učení se simulovanými anotacemi a různými vzorkovacími strategiemi na existujících datových sadách z obou domén, abychom vyhodnotili výkon Forum 4.0. Forum 4.0 dosahuje slibných klasifikačních výsledků (ROC-AUC 0.9 se sto anotovaných vzorků), pomocí transformátorových vložení s lehkým logistickým regresním modelem. Vysvětlujeme, jak je architektura Forum 4.0 použitelná pro miliony uživatelských komentářů v reálném čase, přesto za realizovatelné náklady na školení a klasifikaci.', 'jv': 'Common: politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness This paper inserts forum 4.0, an open-source frame to semi-automatically detect, ageregate, and Visulate user komentations supported on label defined by domain Specis. Awak dhéwé éntuk aplikasi kanggo nggambar forum 4.0 karo sembaran anyar tentang kanggo ngilanggar barang nggawe Perintari online karo tindahan aplikasi. Awake dhéwé outline underliner architecture, tambah web-basa pengguna-pengguna, akèh pengguna-pengguna, lan akèh pengguna-pengguna kanggo nggawe tasks. Awak dhéwé nglanggar éntuk mulai perbudhakan ing sampeyan karo hal-hal dadi sing perusahaan karo nggawe dataset sing dibutuhke sak dadi iki dadi pentar nggawe lanjut sawar nggawe barang forum 4.0 forum 4.0 success Awak dhéwé ngerasakno kung angka architecture forum 4.0 iso dianggawe kanggo komentar milion dolar kanggo nguasakno sing dirakno, nango iso teka luwih tambah lan kelas', 'sk': 'Z naraščajočim številom uporabniških komentarjev na različnih področjih, vključno s komentarji na spletnem novinarstvu in spletnih straneh elektronskega poslovanja, postane ročna analiza vsebine teh komentarjev zamudna in zahtevna. Vendar pa so raziskave pokazale, da uporabniški komentarji vsebujejo koristne informacije za različne strokovnjake na področju domen, kar je zato vredno poiskati in uporabiti. Ta prispevek predstavlja Forum 4.0, odprtokodni okvir za polavtomatsko analizo, združevanje in vizualizacijo uporabniških komentarjev na podlagi oznak, ki jih določijo strokovnjaki za domeno. Prikazujemo uporabnost foruma 4.0 s scenariji analitike komentarjev znotraj domen spletnega novinarstva in trgovin z aplikacijami. Opisujemo osnovno arhitekturo kontejnerjev, vključno s spletnim uporabniškim vmesnikom, komponento strojnega učenja in upravljalnikom opravil za dolgotrajna opravila. Končno izvajamo poskuse strojnega učenja s simuliranimi opombami in različnimi strategijami vzorčenja na obstoječih naborih podatkov iz obeh področij, da ocenimo učinkovitost Foruma 4.0. Forum 4.0 dosega obetavne rezultate klasifikacije (ROC-AUC 0,9 s 100 označenimi vzorci), pri čemer uporablja transformatorske vgradnje z lahkim logističnim regresijskim modelom. Razložimo, kako je arhitektura Foruma 4.0 uporabna za milijone komentarjev uporabnikov v realnem času, vendar z izvedljivimi stroški usposabljanja in klasifikacije.', 'ha': "Idan an ƙara wa ƙidãyar mawaɗin mai amfani da shi a cikin wurãre dabam-daban, kamar misãlai masu cikin majarin journalisi da masu shawarar-masu yin amfani da su, sai an ƙara anayyar cikin maɓallin hannuwansu masu yin amfani da lokaci da za'a ƙara. A lokacin da, research ya nuna cewa sunan amfani da mai amfani ga masu karatun masu iya amfani ga masu cikin dukka dabam, da kwamfyutan ya kamata gano da amfani. Wannan takardar na gane Forum 4.0, wata firam mai buɗe-source dõmin ya yi Analyza, ɗaɗaɗaɗaɗe, kuma ya nuna mai amfani da shi a kan alama wanda na ƙayyade na tsari. Tuna nuna shirin ayuka na Forum 4.0 da fassarar masu basĩri cikin garwayan da majarin apps. Mu ƙayyade layin cikin kayan ƙaranci, kamar shirin mai amfani da kwamfyuta, mai amfani da kwamfyutan tebur, componin da za'a karanta kwamfyutan, da manajan aikin da za'a yi amfani da wa lokaci. Haƙĩƙa, Munã aikin jarrabo masu karanta mashine da masu motsi kamar misalin da akan misalin masu motsi masu sami'a da ke sami-sami masu ciki daga duk Domen don mu canza zarar da aikin Forum 4.0. Forum 4.0 na sãmu fasanni masu yi wa'adi da ake yi wa'adi (CRC-AUC 0.9 da 100 misãlai da aka sanar da shi), kuma yana amfani da shirin juyi-shifo da wani motel mai sauƙi na rubutun logistic. Munã bayyana ko da ake amfani da matsayin Forum 4.0 za'a yi amfani da millions na mai amfani da mai amfani da shi a lokacin da gaske, kuma amma, a kan masu amfani da aikin wahalar da fassarar.", 'he': 'With the increasing number of user comments in diverse domains, including comments on online journalism and e-commerce websites, the manual content analysis of these comments becomes time-consuming and challenging.  עם זאת, מחקר הראה כי הערות משתמשים מכילות מידע שימושי למומחים בתחומים שונים, שכך שווה למצוא ולהשתמש. העבודה הזו מציגה את פורום 4.0, מסגרת מקור פתוח כדי לנתח, לארגון וחצי אוטומטי, ולדמיין תגובות משתמשים מבוססת על תוויות שמגדרות על ידי מומחים בתחום. We demonstrate the applicability of Forum 4.0 with comments analytics scenarios within the domains of online journalism and app stores.  אנחנו מציירים את הארכיטקטורה המרכזית המרכזית, כולל ממשק המשתמש המבוסס באינטרנט, המרכיב ללמוד מכונות, ומנהל המשימות למשימות שדרושות זמן. סוף סוף אנו מבצעים ניסויים ללמוד מכונות עם ציונים סמיולציונים וסטרטגיות דוגמיות שונות על קבוצות נתונים קיימות משני התחומים כדי להעריך את ההופעה של הפורום 4.0. הפורום 4.0 משיג תוצאות מסווגים מבטיחות (ROC-AUC =0.9 עם 100 דגימות מסומנות), בשימוש בתכניות מבוססות על מעבר עם דוגמנית גירוס לוגיסטית קלה. אנחנו מסבירים איך הארכיטקטורה של הפורום 4.0 מתאימה למיליוני תגובות משתמשים בזמן אמיתי, אך בעלות אימונים ומסגרות אפשריות.', 'bo': 'With the increasing number of user comments in various domains, including comments on online journalism and e-commerce websites, the manual content analysis of these comments becomes time-consuming and challenging. However, research showed that user comments contain useful information for different domain experts, which is thus worth finding and utilizing. This paper introduces Forum 4.0, an open-source framework to semi-automatically analyze, aggregate, and visualize user comments based on labels defined by domain experts. ང་ཚོས་དྲ་རྒྱའི་གསར་གནས་དང་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ཆས་ཁང་གི་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་མཁན་གྱི་མཆན་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཆོག We outline the underlying container architecture, including the web-based user interface, the machine learning component, and the task manager for time-consuming tasks. ང་ཚོས་མཐའ་མཇུག་རྫོགས་གྱིས་མ་མཐུན་པའི་བརྡ་སྟོན་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་མ་འདྲ་བྱེད་པ་ལས་སྤྱོད་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་གཉིས་ལས་དབུལ Forum 4.0 achieves promising classification results (ROC-AUC  0.9 with 100 annotated samples), utilizing transformer-based embeddings with a lightweight logistic regression model. ང་ཚོས་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཚོའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བཞིན་པའི་གཟུགས་བརྗོད་དང་། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན་ཐུབ་པ་དང་། དེ་ནའང་དུས་ཡར་'}
{'en': 'SLTEV : Comprehensive Evaluation of Spoken Language Translation', 'ar': 'SLTEV: تقييم شامل لترجمة اللغة المنطوقة', 'es': 'SLTEV: Evaluación integral de la traducción de idiomas hablados', 'fr': 'SLTEV\xa0: Évaluation complète de la traduction en langue parlée', 'pt': 'SLTEV: Avaliação Abrangente da Tradução de Línguas Faladas', 'ja': 'SLTEV ：口語翻訳の包括的評価', 'hi': 'SLTEV: बोली जाने वाली भाषा अनुवाद का व्यापक मूल्यांकन', 'zh': 'SLTEV:口语译综评估', 'ru': 'SLTEV: Комплексная оценка перевода разговорного языка', 'ga': 'SLTEV: Meastóireacht Chuimsitheach ar Aistriúchán Teanga Labhartha', 'hu': 'SLTEV: A beszélt nyelvi fordítás átfogó értékelése', 'el': 'Ολοκληρωμένη Αξιολόγηση της Γλωσσικής Μετάφρασης', 'kk': 'SLTEV: Орындалған тіл аудармасының толық оқу', 'lt': 'SLTEV: Išsamus kalbos vertimo vertimo vertinimas', 'it': 'SLTEV: Valutazione completa della traduzione linguistica parlata', 'ka': 'Name', 'mk': 'СЛТЕВ: Комплементна евалуација на преводот на зборен јазик', 'ms': 'SLTEV: Evaluasi Komprensif Terjemahan Bahasa Bercakap', 'mt': 'SLTEV: Evalwazzjoni Komprensiva tat-Traduzzjoni tal-Lingwa Kkellma', 'pl': 'SLTEV: Kompleksowa ocena tłumaczenia języka mówionego', 'ml': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'sr': 'SLTEV: Kompletna procjena prevoda govornog jezika', 'mn': 'SLTEV: Суудлын хэл хөгжлийн бүрэн дүгнэлт', 'no': 'SLTEV: Comprehensive Evaluering of Spoken Language Translation', 'so': 'SLTEV: Comprehensive Evaluation of Spoken Language Translation', 'si': 'SLTEV: ස්පූක් භාෂාව භාෂාව සම්පූර්ණ විශ්ලේෂණය', 'sv': 'SLTEV: Omfattande utvärdering av språköversättning', 'ta': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'ur': 'SLTEV: اسپاک زبان ترجمہ کی عمدہ ارزش', 'ro': 'SLTEV: Evaluarea cuprinzătoare a traducerii limbilor vorbite', 'vi': 'Trình đọc rộng ngôn ngữ', 'uz': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'bg': 'СЛТЕВ: Цялостна оценка на езиковия превод', 'hr': 'SLTEV: Uhvatljiva procjena prevoda govornog jezika', 'nl': 'SLTEV: Uitgebreide Evaluatie van Gesproken Taalvertaling', 'da': 'SLTEV: Omfattende evaluering af sprogoversættelse', 'de': 'SLTEV: Umfassende Evaluation der gesprochenen Übersetzung', 'id': 'SLTEV: Evaluasi Komprensif dari Terjemahan Bahasa Berbicara', 'ko': 'SLTEV: 구어 번역의 종합 평가', 'fa': 'SLTEV: Evaluation Comprehensive of Spoken Language Translation', 'sw': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'tr': 'SLTEV: Gürjükli dil terjimesiniň täpetli deňlemesi', 'af': 'SLTEV: Kompleksie Evaluering van Spoken Taal Vertaling', 'am': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'az': 'SLTEV: S칬zl칲 Dil 칂evirm톛sinin T톛rcl톛nm톛sini T톛rcl톛m톛si', 'sq': 'SLTEV: Vlerësim i plotë i përkthimit të gjuhës së folur', 'bn': 'Please see http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'bs': 'SLTEV: Kompletna procjena prevoda govornog jezika', 'hy': 'ՍԼԹԵՎ. Խոսվող լեզվի թարգմանման ընդհանուր գնահատումը', 'ca': 'SLTEV: Evaluació completa de la traducció del llenguatge parlat', 'cs': 'SLTEV: Komplexní hodnocení překladu mluveného jazyka', 'fi': 'SLTEV: Puhutun kielen kääntämisen kattava arviointi', 'et': 'SLTEV: rääkiva keele tõlke põhjalik hindamine', 'ha': '@ item Spelling dictionary', 'sk': 'SLTEV: Celovito ocenjevanje prevajanja govorjenega jezika', 'he': 'SLTEV: Comprehensive Evaluation of Spoken Language Translation', 'jv': 'SLMEV: Compréthice measurement of Language translation', 'bo': 'SLTEV: Comprehensive Evaluation of Spoken Language Translation'}
{'en': 'Automatic evaluation of Machine Translation (MT) quality has been investigated over several decades. Spoken Language Translation (SLT), esp. when simultaneous, needs to consider additional criteria and does not have a standard evaluation procedure and a widely used toolkit. To fill the gap, we develop SLTev, an open-source tool for assessing SLT in a comprehensive way. SLTev reports the quality, latency, and stability of an SLT candidate output based on the time-stamped transcript and reference translation into a target language. For quality, we rely on sacreBLEU which provides MT evaluation measures such as chrF or BLEU. For latency, we propose two new scoring techniques. For stability, we extend the previously defined measures with a normalized Flicker in our work. We also propose a new averaging of older measures. A preliminary version of SLTev was used in the IWSLT 2020 shared task. Moreover, a growing collection of test datasets directly accessible by SLTev are provided for system evaluation comparable across papers.', 'ar': 'تم التحقيق في التقييم التلقائي لجودة الترجمة الآلية (MT) على مدى عدة عقود. ترجمة اللغة المنطوقة (SLT) ، خاصة. عندما يكون متزامنًا ، يحتاج إلى مراعاة معايير إضافية وليس لديه إجراء تقييم قياسي ومجموعة أدوات مستخدمة على نطاق واسع. لسد الفجوة ، قمنا بتطوير SLTev ، وهي أداة مفتوحة المصدر لتقييم SLT بطريقة شاملة. يُبلغ SLTev عن جودة إخراج مرشح SLT وزمن وصوله واستقراره بناءً على نسخة مختومة بالوقت وترجمة مرجعية إلى لغة مستهدفة. من أجل الجودة ، نعتمد على sacreBLEU الذي يوفر مقاييس تقييم الترجمة الآلية مثل chrF أو BLEU. بالنسبة لوقت الاستجابة ، نقترح طريقتين جديدتين لتسجيل النتائج. من أجل الاستقرار ، نقوم بتوسيع الإجراءات المحددة مسبقًا باستخدام وميض عادي في عملنا. نقترح أيضًا متوسطًا جديدًا للمقاييس القديمة. تم استخدام نسخة أولية من SLTev في مهمة IWSLT 2020 المشتركة. علاوة على ذلك ، يتم توفير مجموعة متزايدة من مجموعات بيانات الاختبار التي يمكن الوصول إليها مباشرة بواسطة SLTev لتقييم النظام يمكن مقارنته عبر الأوراق.', 'es': 'La evaluación automática de la calidad de la traducción automática (MT) se ha investigado durante varias décadas. La traducción oral en el idioma (SLT), especialmente cuando es simultánea, debe considerar criterios adicionales y no tiene un procedimiento de evaluación estándar ni un kit de herramientas ampliamente utilizado. Para llenar el vacío, desarrollamos SLTev, una herramienta de código abierto para evaluar SLT de manera integral. SLTev informa de la calidad, latencia y estabilidad de la salida de un candidato SLT en función de la transcripción con marca de tiempo y la traducción de referencia a un idioma de destino. Para la calidad, confiamos en SacreBleu, que proporciona medidas de evaluación de MT como CHRF o BLEU. Para la latencia, proponemos dos nuevas técnicas de puntuación. Para mayor estabilidad, ampliamos las medidas previamente definidas con un Flicker normalizado en nuestro trabajo. También proponemos un nuevo promedio de las medidas más antiguas. Se utilizó una versión preliminar de SLTev en la tarea compartida de IWSLT 2020. Además, se proporciona una colección cada vez mayor de conjuntos de datos de pruebas directamente accesibles por SLTev para una evaluación del sistema comparable entre documentos.', 'pt': 'A avaliação automática da qualidade da tradução automática (MT) tem sido investigada ao longo de várias décadas. Tradução de Línguas Faladas (SLT), esp. quando simultânea, precisa considerar critérios adicionais e não possui um procedimento de avaliação padrão e um kit de ferramentas amplamente utilizado. Para preencher a lacuna, desenvolvemos o SLTev, uma ferramenta de código aberto para avaliar o SLT de forma abrangente. O SLTev relata a qualidade, latência e estabilidade de uma saída candidata SLT com base na transcrição com carimbo de data e hora e na tradução de referência para um idioma de destino. Para qualidade, contamos com sacreBLEU, que fornece medidas de avaliação de MT, como chrF ou BLEU. Para latência, propomos duas novas técnicas de pontuação. Para estabilidade, estendemos as medidas previamente definidas com um Flicker normalizado em nosso trabalho. Também propomos uma nova média das medidas mais antigas. Uma versão preliminar do SLTev foi usada na tarefa compartilhada IWSLT 2020. Além disso, uma coleção crescente de conjuntos de dados de teste diretamente acessíveis pelo SLTev é fornecida para avaliação do sistema comparável entre documentos.', 'hi': 'मशीन अनुवाद (एमटी) गुणवत्ता के स्वचालित मूल्यांकन की जांच कई दशकों में की गई है। स्पोकन लैंग्वेज ट्रांसलेशन (SLT), esp. जब एक साथ, अतिरिक्त मानदंडों पर विचार करने की आवश्यकता होती है और इसमें एक मानक मूल्यांकन प्रक्रिया और व्यापक रूप से उपयोग किया जाने वाला टूलकिट नहीं होता है। अंतर को भरने के लिए, हम SLTev, एक व्यापक तरीके से SLT का आकलन करने के लिए एक खुला स्रोत उपकरण विकसित करते हैं। SLTev एक लक्ष्य भाषा में समय-मुद्रांकित प्रतिलेख और संदर्भ अनुवाद के आधार पर एक SLT उम्मीदवार आउटपुट की गुणवत्ता, विलंबता और स्थिरता की रिपोर्ट करता है। गुणवत्ता के लिए, हम sacreBLEU पर भरोसा करते हैं जो MT मूल्यांकन उपाय जैसे chrF या BLEU प्रदान करता है। विलंबता के लिए, हम दो नई स्कोरिंग तकनीकों का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। स्थिरता के लिए, हम अपने काम में एक सामान्यीकृत झिलमिलाहट के साथ पहले से परिभाषित उपायों का विस्तार करते हैं। हम पुराने उपायों के एक नए औसत का भी प्रस्ताव करते हैं। IWSLT 2020 साझा कार्य में SLTev के एक प्रारंभिक संस्करण का उपयोग किया गया था। इसके अलावा, SLTev द्वारा सीधे सुलभ परीक्षण डेटासेट का एक बढ़ता संग्रह कागजों में तुलनीय सिस्टम मूल्यांकन के लिए प्रदान किया जाता है।', 'ja': '機械翻訳（ MT ）品質の自動評価は、数十年にわたって調査されています。 口語翻訳（ SLT ）、特に同時に行う場合、追加の基準を考慮する必要があり、標準的な評価手順と広く使用されているツールキットを持っていません。 このギャップを埋めるために、SLTを包括的に評価するためのオープンソースのツールであるSLTevを開発しました。 SLTevは、タイムスタンプされたトランスクリプトとターゲット言語への参照翻訳に基づいて、SLT候補出力の品質、遅延、および安定性を報告します。 品質に関しては、chrFやBLEUなどのMT評価尺度を提供するsacreBLEUに依存しています。 レイテンシについては、2つの新しいスコアリング技術を提案します。 安定性のために、以前に定義されたメジャーを拡張し、作業中に正規化されたフリッカーを使用します。 また、古いメジャーの新しい平均化も提案しています。 SLTevの予備バージョンは、IWSLT 2020共有タスクで使用されました。 さらに、SLTevによって直接アクセス可能なテストデータセットのコレクションは、論文間で比較可能なシステム評価のために提供されます。', 'ru': 'Автоматическая оценка качества машинного перевода (MT) изучалась на протяжении нескольких десятилетий. Перевод на устный язык (SLT), особенно при одновременном использовании, должен учитывать дополнительные критерии и не имеет стандартной процедуры оценки и широко используемого инструментария. Чтобы заполнить пробел, мы разрабатываем SLTev, инструмент с открытым исходным кодом для всесторонней оценки SLT. SLTev сообщает о качестве, запаздывании и стабильности вывода-кандидата SLT на основе транскрипта с меткой времени и перевода ссылки на целевой язык. Что касается качества, мы полагаемся на sacreBLEU, который предоставляет показатели оценки MT, такие как chrF или BLEU. Для латентности мы предлагаем две новые методики подсчета баллов. Для стабильности мы расширяем ранее определенные меры с помощью нормализованного мерцания в нашей работе. Мы также предлагаем новое усреднение старых показателей. Предварительная версия SLTev использовалась в общей задаче IWSLT 2020. Кроме того, для оценки системы, сопоставимой по бумагам, предоставляется растущая коллекция тестовых наборов данных, непосредственно доступных SLTev.', 'ga': 'Rinneadh iniúchadh ar mheastóireacht uathoibríoch ar cháilíocht an Aistriúcháin Meaisín (MT) le roinnt blianta anuas. Aistriúchán Teanga Labhartha (SLT), esp. agus é ag an am céanna, ní mór critéir bhreise a bhreithniú agus níl nós imeachta caighdeánach meastóireachta agus foireann uirlisí a úsáidtear go forleathan ann. Chun an bhearna a líonadh, forbraímid SLTev, uirlis foinse oscailte chun SLT a mheasúnú ar bhealach cuimsitheach. Tuairiscíonn SLTev cáilíocht, foighne agus cobhsaíocht aschuir iarrthóra SLT bunaithe ar an tras-scríbhinn a bhfuil stampa ama air agus ar aistriúchán tagartha go sprioctheanga. Ar mhaithe le cáilíocht, táimid ag brath ar sacreBLEU a sholáthraíonn bearta meastóireachta MT mar chrF nó BLEU. Maidir le foilsiú, molaimid dhá theicníc scórála nua. Ar mhaithe le cobhsaíocht, leathnaímid na bearta a sainíodh roimhe seo le Flicker normalaithe inár gcuid oibre. Molaimid freisin meánú nua de bhearta níos sine. Baineadh úsáid as réamhleagan de SLTev i dtasc comhroinnte IWSLT 2020. Ina theannta sin, soláthraítear bailiúchán méadaitheach de thacair sonraí tástála a bhfuil rochtain dhíreach ag SLTev orthu le haghaidh meastóireachta córais atá inchomparáide trasna páipéir.', 'fr': "L'évaluation automatique de la qualité de la traduction automatique (TA) est étudiée depuis plusieurs décennies. La traduction en langue parlée (SLT), en particulier lorsqu'elle est simultanée, doit prendre en compte des critères supplémentaires et ne dispose pas d'une procédure d'évaluation standard ni d'une boîte à outils largement utilisée. Pour combler cette lacune, nous développons SLTev, un outil open source permettant d'évaluer la SLT de manière globale. SLTev rapporte la qualité, la latence et la stabilité d'une sortie candidate SLT en fonction de la transcription horodatée et de la traduction de référence dans une langue cible. Pour la qualité, nous comptons sur SacreBleu qui fournit des mesures d'évaluation MT telles que ChRF ou BLEU. Pour la latence, nous proposons deux nouvelles techniques de notation. Pour plus de stabilité, nous étendons les mesures précédemment définies avec un scintillement normalisé dans notre travail. Nous proposons également une nouvelle moyenne des anciennes mesures. Une version préliminaire de SLTeV a été utilisée dans la tâche partagée IWSLT 2020. De plus, une collection croissante d'ensembles de données de test directement accessibles par le SLTeV est fournie pour l'évaluation de systèmes comparables entre les articles.", 'zh': '数十年间,机器翻译 (MT) 质者自料。 口语译(SLT),特于同时行之,须思额外之准,并无准的评程广用之工具包。 补其空,发其SLTev,所以周评SLT之具开源。 SLTev 以带时成绩单及言语者参译以闻 SLT 候选输质迟稳定性。 凡质,sacreBLEU供MT估,如chrF或BLEU。 于延迟,二新评分术。 所以持稳定性者,规范化烁以广前度。 又陈新旧度量。 IWSLT 2020 共事用 SLTev 初版本。 此外供亿渐多SLTev可访测试数据集,跨论可比者系统评估。', 'ka': 'მაქსინის გარგზავნის (MT) კაalitეტის ავტომატური განსაზღვრება რამდენიმე წლის განმავლობაში იყო პასუხი. მუშაობელი ენის გასაგრძელება (SLT), esp. როცა ერთადერთი, უნდა დამატებული კრიტერიების შესახებ და არ აქვს სტანდარტური გასაგრძელება პროცესტი და ძალიან გამოყენებული ხე SLTev-ს განვითარებად გავაკეთებთ, რომელიც ახლა გამოსახულებელი საქაღალდე SLT-ს განსახულებლად გავაკეთებთ. Name კვალეტულობისთვის, ჩვენ გვერდებით საკუთარი ბლესო, რომელიც MT-ს განსაზღვრების მოზომილებები, როგორც chrF ან BLEU. ჩვენ გვეძლევა ორი ახალი სკორინტიკური ტექნოგია. სტაბილიტებისთვის, ჩვენ სამუშაოში ნორმალურიზებული Flicker ჩვენი სამუშაოში წინასწორედ განსაზღვრებული მიზემები გავაკეთებთ. ჩვენ ასევე უკეთესი მზადებების განსაზღვრებას ახალი წინასწორება. SLTev-ის პირველი ვერსია იყენებულია IWSLT 2020 წევრებში. დამატებით, SLTev გამოყენებული ტესტის მონაცემების კოლექცია, რომელიც სისტემის განსაზღვრებისთვის შემდგომარებელია.', 'hu': 'A Gépi Fordítás (MT) minőségének automatikus értékelését évtizedek óta vizsgáltuk. A beszélt nyelvi fordítás (SLT), különösen egyidejűleg, további kritériumokat kell figyelembe venni, és nem rendelkezik szabványos értékelési eljárással és széles körben használt eszközkészlettel. A hiány pótlása érdekében kifejlesztjük az SLTev-et, amely egy nyílt forráskódú eszköz az SLT átfogó értékelésére. Az SLTev egy SLT jelölt kimenet minőségét, késleltetését és stabilitását jelenti az időbélyegzett átirat és referencia fordítás alapján egy célnyelvre. A minőség érdekében a sacreBLEU-ra támaszkodunk, amely MT értékelési intézkedéseket biztosít, mint például chrF vagy BLEU. A késleltetésre két új pontszámítási technikát javasolunk. A stabilitás érdekében a korábban meghatározott intézkedéseket normalizált villogással bővítjük munkánkban. Javasoljuk továbbá a régebbi intézkedések új átlagát. Az SLTev előzetes verzióját használták az IWSLT 2020 megosztott feladatban. Ezenkívül az SLTev által közvetlenül hozzáférhető tesztadatok egyre növekvő gyűjteményét biztosítják a rendszerek értékeléséhez, amelyek összehasonlíthatóak a dokumentumok között.', 'el': 'Η αυτόματη αξιολόγηση της ποιότητας της μηχανικής μετάφρασης (ΜΤ) έχει διερευνηθεί επί αρκετές δεκαετίες. Η μετάφραση ομιλούμενης γλώσσας (SLT), ιδίως όταν είναι ταυτόχρονη, πρέπει να λαμβάνει υπόψη πρόσθετα κριτήρια και δεν διαθέτει τυποποιημένη διαδικασία αξιολόγησης και ευρέως χρησιμοποιούμενη εργαλειοθήκη. Για να καλύψουμε το κενό, αναπτύσσουμε ένα εργαλείο ανοικτού κώδικα για την αξιολόγηση των SLT με ολοκληρωμένο τρόπο. Η SLTev αναφέρει την ποιότητα, την καθυστέρηση και τη σταθερότητα μιας υποψήφιας εξόδου βάσει της μεταγραφής και της μετάφρασης αναφοράς με χρονοσφραγίδα σε μια γλώσσα-στόχο. Για την ποιότητα, βασιζόμαστε στο το το οποίο παρέχει μέτρα αξιολόγησης ΜΤ όπως το chrF ή το BLEU. Για την καθυστέρηση, προτείνουμε δύο νέες τεχνικές βαθμολογίας. Για σταθερότητα, επεκτείνουμε τα προηγουμένως καθορισμένα μέτρα με ένα ομαλοποιημένο Flicker στην εργασία μας. Προτείνουμε επίσης έναν νέο μέσο όρο των παλαιότερων μέτρων. Μια προκαταρκτική έκδοση του SLTev χρησιμοποιήθηκε στην κοινή εργασία IWSLT 2020. Επιπλέον, παρέχεται μια αυξανόμενη συλλογή δεδομένων δοκιμών που είναι άμεσα προσβάσιμα από το SLTev για αξιολόγηση συστήματος συγκρίσιμη σε όλα τα έγγραφα.', 'it': "La valutazione automatica della qualità della traduzione automatica (MT) è stata studiata nel corso di diversi decenni. La traduzione linguistica parlata (SLT), in particolare quando simultanea, deve considerare criteri aggiuntivi e non dispone di una procedura di valutazione standard e di un toolkit ampiamente utilizzato. Per colmare il gap, sviluppiamo SLTev, uno strumento open source per valutare SLT in modo completo. SLTev riporta la qualità, la latenza e la stabilità dell'output di un candidato SLT sulla base della trascrizione timbrata e della traduzione di riferimento in una lingua di destinazione. Per la qualità, ci affidiamo a sacreBLEU che fornisce misure di valutazione MT come chrF o BLEU. Per la latenza, proponiamo due nuove tecniche di punteggio. Per la stabilità, estendiamo le misure precedentemente definite con un Flicker normalizzato nel nostro lavoro. Proponiamo anche una nuova media delle misure precedenti. Una versione preliminare di SLTev è stata utilizzata nell'attività condivisa IWSLT 2020. Inoltre, una crescente raccolta di set di dati di test direttamente accessibili da SLTev è fornita per la valutazione del sistema comparabile tra i documenti.", 'kk': 'Машин аудармасының (MT) сапасының автоматты түрде оқу бірнеше ондық жыл бойы зерттеулі. Қолданыстағы тіл аударуы (SLT), т. б. кезде қосымша критерияларды қарастыру керек және стандартты оқу процедуры және көп қолданылатын құралдар панелі жоқ. Орындауын толтыру үшін SLTev- ті ашық көзі құралы, SLT- ті толық түрде оқу үшін жасаймыз. SLTev SLT кандидаттарының шығысының сапасы, кеңістігі және стабильностігін уақыт белгіленген транскрипттің және сілтеме аудармасының мақсатты тіліне негізделген аудармасын хабарлады. Сәттік үшін, біз тұтас BLEU-ге сенеміз. Бұл MT оқу мерзімдерін, мәтін chrF немесе BLEU секілді. Соңғы үшін екі жаңа сұрау техникасын ұсынамыз. Стабилитация үшін, біз алдыңғы анықталған мерзімдерді жұмыстағы Flicker кәдімгі түрде кеңейту үшін. Сонымен қатар, ескі өлшемдердің жаңа орташасына ұсынамыз. SLTev- тың алдыңғы нұсқасы IWSLT 2020 ортақ тапсырмасында қолданылды. Қосымша, SLTev қолданылатын сынақтар деректер қорларының тікелей жеткізілікті жинақтауы жүйелік қағаздарды салыстыру үшін қолданылады.', 'lt': 'Automatinis mašinų vertimo kokybės vertinimas buvo tirtas per keletą dešimtmečių. Kalbos vertimas (SLT), pvz., tuo pačiu metu, turi apsvarstyti papildomus kriterijus ir neturi standartinės vertinimo procedūros ir plačiai naudojamų priemonių rinkinio. Siekiant užpildyti spragą, parengiame SLTev, atvirojo kodo priemonę, skirtą visapusiškai vertinti SLT. SLTev praneša apie SLT kandidato išėjimo kokybę, latenciją ir stabilumą, pagrįstą laiku pažymėtu transkriptu ir nuorodiniu vertimu į tikslinę kalbą. Kad būtų užtikrinta kokybė, mes pasikliaujame šventąja BLEU, kuri numato MT vertinimo priemones, pvz., chrF ar BLEU. For latency, we propose two new scoring techniques.  Siekdami stabilumo, mes išplečiame anksčiau apibrėžtas priemones normalizuotam Flickeriui savo darbe. Mes taip pat siūlome naują vyresnio amžiaus priemonių vidurkį. Išankstinė SLTev versija buvo naudojama bendroje užduotyje „IWSLT 2020“. Be to, vis dažniau renkami bandymų duomenų rinkiniai, tiesiogiai prieinami SLTev, kad būtų galima vertinti sistemą, palyginamą įvairiuose dokumentuose.', 'mk': 'Автоматска проценка на квалитетот на машинската транслатија (МТ) е истражена во текот на неколку децении. Зборуван јазик превед (SLT), специјално кога истовремено, мора да разгледува дополнителни критериуми и нема стандардна процедура на проценка и широко употребена алатка. За да ја пополниме празнината, развиваме SLTev, алатка на отворен код за проценка на SLT на сеопфатен начин. SLTev известува за квалитетот, латеноста и стабилноста на излезот на кандидатот за SLT врз основа на временски транскрипт и референциски превод на јазик на цел. За квалитет, се потпираме на светиот БЛЕУ кој обезбедува мерки за проценка на МТ како што се ХРФ или БЛЕУ. За задоцнување, предложуваме две нови техники за оценка. За стабилност, ги продолжуваме претходно дефинираните мерки со нормализиран Фликер во нашата работа. Ние, исто така, предложуваме ново просекување на постарите мерки. A preliminary version of SLTev was used in the IWSLT 2020 shared task.  Покрај тоа, растечката колекција на тестови податоци директно пристапни од страна на SLTev се обезбедува за системска проценка споредлива меѓу документите.', 'ms': 'Evaluasi automatik kualiti Terjemahan Mesin (MT) telah diseliti selama beberapa dekad. Terjemahan Bahasa Bercakap (SLT), spesifik bila bersamaan, perlu mempertimbangkan kriteria tambahan dan tidak mempunyai prosedur penilaian piawai dan alat yang digunakan secara luas. Untuk mengisi ruang, kami mengembangkan SLTev, alat sumber terbuka untuk menilai SLT dengan cara yang meliputi. SLTev melaporkan kualiti, kelemahan, dan kestabilan output calon SLT berdasarkan transkrip dan terjemahan rujukan pada bahasa sasaran. Untuk kualiti, kami bergantung pada sacreBLEU yang menyediakan tindakan penilaian MT seperti chrF atau BLEU. Untuk keterlaluan, kami cadangkan dua teknik skor baru. Untuk kestabilan, kita memperluas tindakan yang terdefinisikan sebelumnya dengan Flicker yang normal dalam kerja kita. Kami juga menyarankan rata-rata baru bagi tindakan lama. Versi awal SLTev digunakan dalam tugas kongsi IWSLT 2020. Lagipun, koleksi berkembang set data ujian yang boleh diakses secara langsung oleh SLTev disediakan untuk penilaian sistem yang boleh dibandingkan di seluruh kertas.', 'mt': 'L-evalwazzjoni awtomatika tal-kwalità tat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni (MT) ġiet investigata matul diversi deċennji. It-Traduzzjoni tal-Lingwa Spoken (SLT), esp. meta simultanja, teħtieġ li tikkunsidra kriterji addizzjonali u ma jkollhiex proċedura standard ta’ evalwazzjoni u sett ta’ għodod użat ħafna. Biex timtela d-distakk, niżviluppaw SLTev, għodda open-source għall-valutazzjoni tal-SLT b’mod komprensiv. SLTev jirrapporta l-kwalità, it-latenza u l-istabbiltà ta’ produzzjoni ta’ kandidat SLT ibbażata fuq it-traskrizzjoni bit-timbru tal-ħin u t-traduzzjoni ta’ referenza f’lingwa fil-mira. Għall-kwalità, nistrieħu fuq sacreBLEU li tipprovdi miżuri ta’ evalwazzjoni MT bħal chrF jew BLEU. Għad-dewmien, nipproponu żewġ tekniki ġodda ta’ punteġġ. For stability, we extend the previously defined measures with a normalized Flicker in our work.  Aħna nipproponu wkoll medja ġdida ta’ miżuri aktar anzjani. Verżjoni preliminari ta’ SLTev intużat fil-kompitu kondiviż IWSLT 2020. Barra minn hekk, ġabra dejjem tikber ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta tat-testijiet a ċċessibbli direttament minn SLTev hija pprovduta għal evalwazzjoni tas-sistema komparabbli bejn id-dokumenti.', 'pl': 'Automatyczna ocena jakości tłumaczenia maszynowego (MT) badana jest przez kilkadziesiąt lat. Tłumaczenie języka spoken language (SLT), zwłaszcza w przypadku jednoczesnego, musi uwzględnić dodatkowe kryteria i nie posiada standardowej procedury oceny i szeroko stosowanego zestawu narzędzi. Aby wypełnić lukę, opracowujemy SLTev, narzędzie open source do kompleksowej oceny SLT. SLTev raportuje jakość, opóźnienie i stabilność wyjścia kandydata SLT na podstawie transkrypcji z znacznikiem czasu i tłumaczenia referencyjnego na język docelowy. Dla jakości polegamy na sacreBLEU, który dostarcza środki oceny MT, takie jak chrF czy BLEU. Dla opóźnień proponujemy dwie nowe techniki punktowania. Dla stabilności w naszej pracy rozszerzamy wcześniej zdefiniowane miary o znormalizowany Flicker. Proponujemy również nowe uśrednienie starszych środków. Wstępna wersja SLTev została wykorzystana w zadaniu wspólnym IWSLT 2020. Ponadto coraz większy zbiór zbiorów danych testowych dostępnych bezpośrednio przez SLTev jest dostarczany do oceny systemu porównywalnego w różnych dokumentach.', 'no': 'Automatisk evaluering av maskinsomsetjingskvalitet (MT) er undersøkt over fleire tiår. Spoken Language Translation (SLT), esp. when simultaneously, needs to consider additional criteria and does not have a standard evaluation procedure and a widely used toolkit. For å fylle mellomrommet, utviklar vi SLTev, eit opna kjeldeverktøy for å vurdere SLT på ein komplett måte. SLTev rapporterer kvaliteten, latens og stabiliteten av ein SLT-kandidatutdata basert på tidstamperte transkript og referansomsetjinga til eit målspråk. For kvalitet kan vi bruke på sakte BLEU som tilbyr MT-evalueringstiltak som chrF eller BLEU. For latens foreslår vi to nye skoringteknikk. For stabilitet utvidar vi dei førre definerte målene med ein normalisert Flicker i arbeidet vårt. Vi foreslår også ein ny gjennomsnitt av eldre mål. Ein førehandsvising av SLTev vart brukt i delt oppgåve IWSLT 2020. I tillegg er det tilgjengeleg til SLTev ein økende samling av testdatasett for systemevaluering som er sammenlignbar over papir.', 'sr': 'Automatska procjena kvalitete prevoda mašine (MT) istražena je tokom nekoliko decenija. Prevod govornog jezika (SLT), esp. kada je istovremeno, mora razmotriti dodatne kriterije i nema standardnu proceduru za procjenu i široko korištenu kutiju alata. Da bi napunili prazninu, razvili smo SLTev, alat otvorenog izvora za procjenu SLT-a na sveobuhvatan način. SLTev prijavljuje kvalitetu, latenciju i stabilnost proizvoda kandidata SLT-a na osnovu prijenosa i referentnog prevoda na ciljni jezik. Za kvalitet se oslanjamo na svetu BLEU koja pruža mjere procjene MT-a poput chrF ili BLEU. Za latenciju predlažemo dve nove tehnike izvlačenja. Za stabilnost, proširimo prethodno definisane mjere sa normalizovanom Flickerom u našem poslu. Takođe predlažemo novi prosječavanje starijih mjera. Preliminarna verzija SLTev je korišćena u zajedničkom zadatku IWSLT 2020. Osim toga, rastuća kolekcija testnih seta podataka koje je direktno dostupna SLTev pruža se za procjenu sistema usporednom preko papira.', 'ml': 'മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷണത്തിന്റെ സ്വയം പരിശോധിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ പരിഭാഷ (SLT), എസ്പി, ഒരേ സമയത്ത്, കൂടുതല്\u200d ക്രമീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ചിന്തിക്കേണ്ടതുണ്ട്. സാധാരണ വിലാസപ്രക്രിയയും വിശാലമായി ഉപയ To fill the gap, we develop SLTev, an open-source tool for assessing SLT in a comprehensive way.  എസ്എല്\u200dടെവ് ഒരു എസ്എല്\u200dടി പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന പുറത്തിന്റെ ഗുണവും, ലേറ്റെന്\u200dസിയും സ്ഥിരമായി റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നു. സമയത്തി സാക്രെബ്ലിയുവിന് വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d ആശ്രയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് എംടി വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നു. ക്രെഫ് അല്ലെങ് അവസാനത്തിനായി നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു പുതിയ സ്കോരിങ്ങ് ടെക്നിക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നു. സ്ഥിരതയ്ക്ക് വേണ്ടി മുമ്പ് നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന പരിപാടികള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ജോലിയില്\u200d സാധാരണ ഫ്ലിക് നമ്മളും പുതിയ പ്രായമുള്ള പ്രകാരം പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. IWSLT 2020 പങ്കാളിയുള്ള ജോലിയില്\u200d SLTev-ന്റെ ആദ്യ പതിപ്പു് ഉപയോഗിച്ചു. സിസ്റ്റം മുഴുവന്\u200d പേപ്പറുകളിലും തുല്യമായ പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഡേറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d നേരിട്ട് സ്വീകരിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്ന', 'so': "Qiimeynta kaartaynta tarjumaadda machine (MT) waxaa lagu baaraandegay sanado badan. Spoken Language Translation (SLT), esp. when simultaneous, needs to consider additional criteria and does not have a standard evaluation procedure and a widely used toolkit.  Si a an u buuxino burburka, waxaynu u horumarinnaa SLTev, taas oo ah qalabka furan ee lagu qiimeeyo SLT si koox ah. SLTev wuxuu wargeliyaa waxyaabaha suurtagalka SLT oo ku saleysan qoraalka iyo turjumista qoraalka iyo turjumista afka goalka ah. Qiimaha, waxaynu isku hallaynaynaa sacreBLEU, kaasoo bixiya qiyaastii MT sida chrF ama BLEU. ugu dambeyso, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa laba qaabab oo cusub oo jimicsi ah. Isku'aanta aawadeed, waxaynu horay u sii fidinnaa qiyaastii la qoray ee la caadi ahaa Flicker shaqadeenna. Sidoo kale waxaan soo jeedaynaa qiyaastii cusub ee da'da ah. IWSLT 2020 waxaa lagu isticmaalay warqada hore ee SLTev. Sidoo kale waxaa sidoo kale laga helaa guryo koritaan oo si toos ah u isticmaali karo SLTev oo loo qiimeyn karo nidaamka oo u eg warqadaha oo dhan.", 'si': 'මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය (MT) කුළුවත්වය ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්වාසය සඳහා විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙනවා. ස්පෝක් භාෂාව අවවාදය (SLT), esp. එකම වෙලාවෙන්, තවත් අවශ්\u200dය අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාසයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා ඒවගේම ස අපි SLTev විශ්වාස කරන්න, SLT විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරවේශයක්. SLTev වාර්තාවෙන්නේ SLT නියෝජිත ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියේ ස්ථිර විශේෂය, ලේටින්සි, සහ ස්ථිර විශේෂතාවක් තියෙනවා වෙලාව-  ප්\u200dරතිශේෂතාවට, අපි විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා තියෙනවා කියලා MT විශ්වාස ක්\u200dරීෆ් නැත්ත BLUE වගේ. අපි අලුත් ස්කෝරින් තාක්ෂණය දෙකක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. ස්ථිර විශ්වාසයෙන්, අපි කලින් වැඩක් සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරමාණයක් අපේ වැඩේ සාමාන්\u200d අපි අලුත් අනුවෙන් අනුවෙන් අනුවෙන් අනුවෙන් අනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සැලසුම් කරනවා. SLTev ගේ ප්\u200dරධාන ආවෘත්තියක් IWSLT 2020යි භාවිත කරලා තියෙන්නේ. පරීක්ෂණා දත්ත සෙට්ටුවක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන් පද්ධතිය පරීක්ෂණය සම්බන්ධයක් පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය ප', 'mn': 'Машин хөрөнгө оруулах (MT) сайн чанарын автоматически дүгнэлт хэдэн жилийн турш судалгдсан. Гол хэл хөгжлийн орчуулалт (SLT), esp. хамтдаа нэмэлт шаардлагатай учраас стандарт шаардлагатай шаардлагатай болон маш олон хэрэглэгдсэн асуудал хэрэглэгддэггүй. Зай дүүргэхийн тулд бид SLTev-г нээлттэй эх үүсвэрийн хэрэгсэл болгодог. SLTev цаг хугацааны хэлбэрээр зориулагдсан транскрипт болон санал зориулагдсан хэлбэрээр SLT хүндлэгчдийн үр дүнгийн сайн чанар, тайлбар болон тогтвортой байдал өгдөг. Сайн чанарын тулд бид хРФ эсвэл БЛЕС зэрэг MT-ын оюутнуудыг дэмжиж буй sacreBLEU-д итгэдэг. Сүүлийн үеийн хувьд бид хоёр шинэ сүлжээний техник санал болгоно. Энгийн тогтвортой байдлын тулд бид өмнө тодорхойлогдсон хэмжээсүүдийг бидний ажлын хэмжээсүүдийн Фликерээр нэмэгдүүлнэ. Мөн бид том хэмжээсүүдийн дундаж дундаж шинэ санал өгдөг. SLTev-ын анхны хувилбар IWSLT 2020 оны хуваалтын ажил дээр хэрэглэгдсэн. Мөн SLTev-ын шууд ашиглах боломжтой тест өгөгдлийн сангийн цуглуулга нь системийн хуудас цаасан дээр харьцуулагддаг.', 'ro': 'Evaluarea automată a calității traducerii automate (MT) a fost investigată de-a lungul mai multor decenii. Traducerea limbilor vorbite (SLT), în special atunci când este simultană, trebuie să ia în considerare criterii suplimentare și nu are o procedură standard de evaluare și un set de instrumente utilizat pe scară largă. Pentru a umple golul, dezvoltăm SLTev, un instrument open-source pentru evaluarea SLT într-un mod cuprinzător. SLTev raportează calitatea, latența și stabilitatea rezultatelor unui candidat SLT pe baza transcrierii ștampilate de timp și traducerii de referință într-o limbă țintă. Pentru calitate, ne bazăm pe sacreBLEU care oferă măsuri de evaluare MT, cum ar fi chrF sau BLEU. Pentru latență, propunem două noi tehnici de scoring. Pentru stabilitate, extindem măsurile definite anterior cu un Flicker normalizat în munca noastră. Propunem, de asemenea, o nouă medie a măsurilor mai vechi. O versiune preliminară a SLTev a fost utilizată în sarcina partajată IWSLT 2020. Mai mult decât atât, o colecție tot mai mare de seturi de date de testare accesibile direct de SLTev sunt furnizate pentru evaluarea sistemului comparabilă în documente.', 'ta': 'இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (MT) தரம் தானாகவே பரிசோதிக்கப்பட்டது பல ஆண்டுகளாக. @ info இந்த இடைவெளியை நிரப்புவதற்கு, நாம் SLTev, ஒரு திறந்த மூல கருவியை முழுமையான வழியில் மதிப்பிடுவதற்கு. SLTev சேர்க்கப்பட்ட நேரத்தின் மாற்று எழுத்து மற்றும் மொழியில் மொழிமாற்றி அடிப்படையில் SLT சார்ந்திருப்பாளர் வெளியீட்ட தரமுக்கு, நாங்கள் சாக்ரெப்லீயு நம்பிக்கை கொள்கிறோம். எம்டி மதிப்பினை எடுத்துக்கொள்கிறார்கள். சமீபத்திற்கு, நாம் இரண்டு புதிய மதிப்பெண் தொழில்நுட்பத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். நிலையான, நாம் முன்னோட்டத்தில் வரையறுக்கப்பட்ட அளவுகளை ஒரு இயல்பான பிளிக்கர் வேலையில் நீட்டுவோம். நாம் பழைய அளவுகளின் புதிய சராசரியான முறையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். IWSLT 2020 பகிர்ந்த பணியில் SLTev முதல் பதிப்பு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டது. மேலும், SLTev ஆல் நேரடியாக அணுகக்கூடிய சோதனை தரவுத்தளங்களின் வளர்ச்சி முறைமை மதிப்பிற்கு அமைப்பு தாள்கள் முழும', 'sv': 'Automatisk utvärdering av maskinöversättning (MT) kvalitet har undersökts under flera decennier. Talad språköversättning (SLT), dvs. vid samtidig användning, behöver överväga ytterligare kriterier och har inte ett standardutvärderingsförfarande och en allmänt använd verktygslåda. För att fylla luckan utvecklar vi SLTev, ett open source verktyg för att bedöma SLT på ett heltäckande sätt. SLTev rapporterar kvaliteten, latensen och stabiliteten hos en SLT-kandidatutmatning baserat på den tidsstämplade transkriptionen och referensöversättningen till ett målspråk. För kvalitet förlitar vi oss på sacreBLEU som tillhandahåller MT utvärderingsåtgärder såsom chrF eller BLEU. För latens föreslår vi två nya poängtekniker. För stabilitet utökar vi de tidigare definierade åtgärderna med en normaliserad flimmer i vårt arbete. Vi föreslår också ett nytt genomsnitt av äldre åtgärder. En preliminär version av SLTev användes i IWSLT 2020 delad uppgift. Dessutom tillhandahålls en växande samling testdatauppsättningar som är direkt tillgängliga av SLTev för systemutvärdering jämförbara mellan olika dokument.', 'ur': 'ماشین ترجمن (MT) کیلوٹی کی آٹوٹی ارزیابی چند دهوں کے بعد تحقیق کی گئی ہے. Spoken Language Translation (SLT), esp. when simultaneously, needs to consider additional criteria and does not have a standard evaluation procedure and a widely used toolkit. فاصلہ بھر جانے کے لئے ہم SLTev کو گھیر لیتے ہیں، ایک آپن سورس تولیل ہے SLT کو ایک گھیرے طریقے سے آزمائش کے لئے۔ SLTev ایک SLT کاندینڈیٹ اپوٹٹ کے کیفیٹ، لاٹنسیٹ، اور ثابت کی راپورت کرتا ہے تایمپٹ ٹرانسکرپٹ اور رانس ٹرانسکرپٹ پر ایک موجود زبان میں بنیاد ہے. کیفیت کے لئے، ہم مقدس بلیوس پر بھروسہ رکھتے ہیں جو MT ارزیابی اندازے جیسے chrF یا BLEU پیدا کرتے ہیں۔ لٹینٹی کے لئے ہم دو نو اسکورنگ تکنیک پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں۔ ثابت کے لئے، ہم پہلے مقرر کردہ اندازے کو ہمارے کام میں ایک عام فلکر کے ساتھ پھیلاتے ہیں۔ اور ہم نے پہلے اندازے سے نو دور کر دیا ہے۔ SLTev کا ایک اولین نسخہ IWSLT 2020 کے شریک کام میں استعمال کیا گیا تھا. اور اس کے علاوہ، SLTev کے ذریعہ مستقیماً دسترسی حاصل کرنے والی آزمائش ڈیٹ سٹ کے ایک بڑھنے کے ساتھ سیسٹم کی ارزیابی کے لئے کاغذوں پر مقایسہ ہے.', 'uz': "Name @ info: whatsthis Bunday gap toʻldirish uchun SLTev'ni butun usulda qiymatish uchun ochiq manba asbobi yaratumiz. @ info: whatsthis Quality uchun, biz MT qiymatni, chrF yoki BLEU kabi narsalarni qo'shishga ishonamiz. Yaqinda, biz ikkita yangi qo'shish teknikalarni talab qilamiz. Davom etishga, biz shunday ishda oddiy Flicker bilan ajratilgan qoidalarni ko'paymiz. Biz esa oldingi takliflarning yangi o'rtacha o'zgarishni talab qilamiz. A preliminary version of SLTev was used in the IWSLT 2020 shared task.  Boshqa, SLTev tomonidan aniqlangan sinov maʼlumotlar toʻplami qoʻllanmagan tizim qiymatiga qoʻllaniladi.", 'vi': 'Việc đánh giá tự động chất lượng của Machine Translation (MTV) đã được điều tra qua vài thập kỷ. Dịch Ngôn ngữ nhiều lời, rõ ràng khi đồng thời, cần cân nhắc các tiêu chuẩn bổ sung và không có một thủ tục đánh giá tiêu chuẩn và một bộ dụng cụ phổ biến. Để lấp đầy khoảng trống, chúng tôi phát triển chất nổ dẻo, một công cụ mở nguồn để đánh giá chất dẻo dai nhất. Trình độ chậm, chất lượng và ổn định của một ứng viên trượt tuyết dựa trên bản ghi thời gian đóng dấu và bản dịch tham chiếu thành một ngôn ngữ đích. Với chất lượng, chúng tôi dựa vào các khả năng cao cung cấp các biện pháp đánh giá MTV như Chris hay May. Chúng tôi đề xuất hai kỹ thuật đánh dấu mới. Để ổn định, chúng ta sẽ mở rộng những biện pháp được xác định trước đó bằng một chuyến bay bình thường. Chúng tôi cũng đề nghị một sự thay đổi giữa các biện pháp cũ. Một phiên bản sơ bộ của SLTev đã được dùng trong công việc chung IWSLT 2020. Hơn nữa, một bộ sưu tập dữ liệu thử được giao tiếp trực tiếp bởi SLTev để đánh giá hệ thống tương đối trên các giấy tờ.', 'da': 'Automatisk evaluering af maskinoversættelseskvaliteten (MT) er blevet undersøgt gennem flere årtier. Talen Language Translation (SLT), især når det er samtidig, skal overveje yderligere kriterier og har ikke en standard evalueringsprocedure og et udbredt værktøjssæt. For at udfylde hullet udvikler vi SLTev, et open source-værktøj til vurdering af SLT på en omfattende måde. SLTev rapporterer kvaliteten, latensen og stabiliteten af et SLT kandidatoutput baseret på den tidsstemplede transkription og referenceoversættelse til et målsprog. For kvalitet er vi afhængige af sacreBLEU, som leverer MT evalueringsforanstaltninger såsom chrF eller BLEU. For ventetid foreslår vi to nye scoring teknikker. For stabilitet udvider vi de tidligere definerede mål med en normaliseret Flicker i vores arbejde. Vi foreslår også et nyt gennemsnit af ældre foranstaltninger. En foreløbig version af SLTev blev brugt i IWSLT 2020 delt opgave. Desuden stilles der en voksende samling af testdatasæt direkte tilgængelige for SLTev til rådighed for systemevaluering, der kan sammenlignes på tværs af papirer.', 'hr': 'Automatska procjena kvalitete prevoda strojeva (MT) istražena je tijekom nekoliko decenija. Prevod govornog jezika (SLT), esp. u istodobno vrijeme, mora razmotriti dodatne kriterije i nema standardnu procjenu i široko korištenu alatku. Za ispunjavanje praznina razvijemo SLTev, alat otvorenog izvora za procjenu SLT-a na sveobuhvatan način. SLTev izvještava kvalitet, latenciju i stabilnost proizvoda kandidata SLT-a na temelju prijenosa i referentnog prevoda na ciljni jezik. Za kvalitet se oslanjamo na svetu BLEU-u koja pruža mjere procjene MT-a poput chrF ili BLEU-a. Za latenciju predlažemo dvije nove tehnike izvlačenja. Za stabilnost proširimo prethodno definirane mjere s normalizovanom Flickerom u našem poslu. Također predlažemo novu prosječnost starijih mjera. Preliminarna verzija SLTev se koristila u zajedničkom zadatku IWSLT 2020. Osim toga, rastuća kolekcija testnih seta podataka koje se direktno dostupno SLTev predstavlja za procjenu sustava usporednom preko papira.', 'de': 'Die automatische Bewertung der Qualität der maschinellen Übersetzung (MT) wurde über mehrere Jahrzehnte untersucht. Spoken Language Translation (SLT), insbesondere bei gleichzeitiger Übersetzung, muss zusätzliche Kriterien berücksichtigen und verfügt nicht über ein Standardbewertungsverfahren und ein weit verbreitetes Toolkit. Um die Lücke zu schließen, entwickeln wir SLTev, ein Open-Source-Tool zur umfassenden Bewertung von SLT. SLTev meldet die Qualität, Latenz und Stabilität eines SLT Kandidaten Output basierend auf dem Zeitstempel Transkript und Referenzübersetzung in eine Zielsprache. Für die Qualität setzen wir auf sacreBLEU, das MT-Bewertungsmaßnahmen wie chrF oder BLEU bereitstellt. Für die Latenz schlagen wir zwei neue Scoring-Techniken vor. Zur Stabilität erweitern wir in unserer Arbeit die zuvor definierten Maßnahmen mit einem normalisierten Flicker. Wir schlagen auch eine neue Mittelung älterer Maßnahmen vor. In der gemeinsamen Aufgabe IWSLT 2020 wurde eine vorläufige Version von SLTev verwendet. Darüber hinaus wird eine wachsende Sammlung von Testdatensätzen bereitgestellt, auf die SLTev direkt zugreifen kann, um die Systemauswertung papierübergreifend vergleichbar zu gestalten.', 'bg': 'Автоматичната оценка на качеството на машинния превод (МТ) е изследвана в продължение на няколко десетилетия. Преводът на говорен език (SLT), особено когато е едновременно, трябва да се вземат предвид допълнителни критерии и няма стандартна процедура за оценяване и широко използван инструментариум. За да запълним празнината, разработваме инструмент с отворен код за цялостна оценка на СЛТ. SLTev отчита качеството, латентността и стабилността на кандидат-изхода на SLT въз основа на времеви печати и референтен превод на целеви език. За качество, ние разчитаме на който осигурява мерки за оценка на МТ като например ХРФ или БЛЮ. За латентност предлагаме две нови техники за оценка. За стабилност разширяваме предварително дефинираните мерки с нормализирано трептене в работата си. Предлагаме и ново осредняване на по-старите мерки. Предварителна версия на СЛТЕВ беше използвана в споделената задача по международен транспорт 2020. Освен това нарастваща колекция от тестови набори с данни, пряко достъпни от SLTev, се предоставя за оценка на системата, сравнима между документите.', 'id': 'Evaluasi otomatis kualitas Translation Machine (MT) telah diselidiki selama beberapa dekade. Terjemahan Bahasa Berbicara (SLT), spesial saat bersamaan, perlu mempertimbangkan kriteria tambahan dan tidak memiliki prosedur evaluasi standar dan alat yang sangat digunakan. Untuk mengisi celah, kami mengembangkan SLTev, alat sumber terbuka untuk menilai SLT secara komprensif. SLTev melaporkan kualitas, keterlaluan, dan stabilitas output kandidat SLT berdasarkan transkrip dan terjemahan referensi time-stamped ke bahasa sasaran. Untuk kualitas, kami bergantung pada sacreBLEU yang menyediakan tindakan evaluasi MT seperti chrF atau BLEU. Untuk keterlaluan, kami mengusulkan dua teknik skor baru. Untuk stabilitas, kita memperpanjang tindakan yang terdefinisikan sebelumnya dengan Flicker yang normal dalam pekerjaan kita. Kami juga mengusulkan rata-rata baru dari tindakan yang lebih tua. A preliminary version of SLTev was used in the IWSLT 2020 shared task.  Selain itu, koleksi berkembang dataset tes yang dapat diakses secara langsung oleh SLTev disediakan untuk evaluasi sistem yang dapat dibandingkan di seluruh kertas.', 'fa': 'ارزیابی خودکار کیفیت ترجمه ماشین (MT) بیش از چند دهه تحقیق شده است. ترجمه زبان اسپانیایی (SLT), اسپانیایی. زمانی همزمان، باید شرایط اضافه را در نظر بگیرد و یک روش ارزیابی استاندارد و یک کیت ابزار وسیع استفاده نمی\u200cکند. برای پر کردن فاصله، ما SLTev را توسعه می\u200cکنیم، یک ابزار منبع باز برای ارزیابی SLT در راه کامل. SLTev گزارش می\u200cدهد که کیفیت، تاریکی و استواری یک خروج کاندیداتی SLT بر اساس ترجمه و ترجمه\u200cهای زمانی به زبان هدف است. برای کیفیت، ما بر مقدس BLEU اعتماد می کنیم که مقدار ارزیابی MT مثل chrF یا BLEU را پیشنهاد می دهد. به خاطر تازگي، ما دو تکنيک جديدي پيشنهاد ميديم. برای استواری، ما پیش از این اندازه\u200cهای تعریف شده را با یک فلیکر عادی در کارمان گسترش می\u200cدهیم. ما همچنین پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم متوسط جدید از اندازه\u200cهای قدیمی. یک نسخه اولیه SLTev در کار مشترک IWSLT 2020 استفاده شد. علاوه بر این، جمع\u200cآوری از مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای آزمایش که مستقیماً توسط SLTev دسترسی دارند برای ارزیابی سیستم که قابل مقایسه بر روی کاغذها است.', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa Tafsiri za Kimashine (MT) umechunguzwa kwa miongo kadhaa. Tafsiri ya lugha (SLT), kwa wakati mmoja, inahitaji kutafakari vigezo vya ziada na haina utaratibu wa tathmini wa kawaida na vifaa vinavyotumiwa vizuri. Ili kuujaza mapambano, tunaendelea SLTev, zana iliyo wazi kwa ajili ya kutathmini SLT kwa njia ya ujumla. SLTev anaripoti kiwango, cha hivi karibuni na utulivu wa matokeo ya mgombea wa SLT kwa kutumia uandishi wa muda mfupi na tafsiri ya kutafsiri katika lugha ya lengo. Kwa kiwango cha ubora, tunategemea sacreBLEU ambacho kinatoa hatua za uchunguzi wa MT kama vile chrF au BLEU. Kwa siku za hivi karibuni, tunapendekeza mbinu mbili mpya za kuchekeza. Kwa utulivu, tunaongeza hatua zilizoelezwa zilizopita kwa mradi wa Flicker wa kawaida katika kazi yetu. We also propose a new averaging of older measures.  Tovuti ya awali ya SLTev ilitumiwa katika kazi ya IWSLT 2020 ilishirikiana. Zaidi ya hayo, mkusanyiko wa taarifa za majaribio unaotumika moja kwa moja na SLTev unapatikana kwa ajili ya uchunguzi wa mfumo unaofanana na makaratasi mbalimbali.', 'nl': 'De automatische evaluatie van de kwaliteit van Machine Translation (MT) is al tientallen jaren onderzocht. Spoken Language Translation (SLT), met name bij simultaan, moet rekening houden met aanvullende criteria en beschikt niet over een standaard evaluatieprocedure en een veelgebruikte toolkit. Om de kloof op te vullen, ontwikkelen we SLTev, een open source tool om SLT op een uitgebreide manier te beoordelen. SLTev rapporteert de kwaliteit, latentie en stabiliteit van een SLT kandidaat output op basis van het tijdstempel transcript en referentievertaling naar een doeltaal. Voor kwaliteit vertrouwen we op sacreBLEU dat MT evaluatiemaatregelen zoals chrF of BLEU levert. Voor latentie stellen we twee nieuwe scoretechnieken voor. Voor stabiliteit breiden we de eerder gedefinieerde maten uit met een genormaliseerde Flicker in ons werk. We stellen ook een nieuwe gemiddelde voor van oudere maatregelen. Een voorlopige versie van SLTev werd gebruikt in de gedeelde taak IWSLT 2020. Bovendien is er een groeiende verzameling testdatasets beschikbaar die rechtstreeks toegankelijk zijn voor SLTev voor systeemevaluatie vergelijkbaar in verschillende papers.', 'ko': '기계 번역의 질에 대한 자동 평가는 이미 수십 년 동안 연구되었다.구어 번역(SLT), 특히 동시에 진행할 때 다른 기준을 고려해야 하며, 표준적인 평가 프로그램과 광범위하게 사용되는 도구 패키지가 없다.이 공백을 메우기 위해 SLTev를 개발했습니다. 이것은 SLT를 전면적으로 평가하는 데 사용되는 소스 오픈 도구입니다.SLTev는 시간 스탬프 성적표와 목표 언어로 번역된 참고 번역문에 따라 SLT 후보 출력의 질, 지연, 안정성을 보고합니다.품질에 있어서, 우리는sacreBLEU에 의존하는데, 이것은 기계 번역 평가 지표인 크루프나 BLEU를 제공한다.지연에 대해 우리는 두 가지 새로운 평점 기술을 제기했다.안정성을 위해서, 우리는 작업 중에 표준화된 플래시를 사용하여 이전에 정의한 도량을 확장했다.우리는 또 새로운 낡은 지표의 평균치를 제기했다.SLTev의 초기 버전은 IWSLT 2020 공유 작업에 사용됩니다.그 밖에 SLTev가 직접 접근할 수 있는 테스트 데이터 집합이 점점 많아져 논문 간의 시스템 평가에 사용될 수 있다.', 'af': "Outomatiese evaluering van Masjien Vertaling (MT) kwaliteit is ondersoek oor veelvuldige dekades. Spoken Taal Vertaling Om die gap te vul, ontwikkel ons SLTev, 'n oop-bron hulpmiddel vir die assensie van SLT op 'n kompleksies manier. SLTev rapporteer die kwaliteit, latensie, en stabiliteit van 'n SLT kandidate uitvoer gebaseer op die tyd- stampeerde transkript en verwysing vertaling in 'n doel taal. Vir kwaliteit, vertrou ons op heilige BLEU wat MT evalueringsmaat verskaf soos chrF of BLEU. Vir latensie voorstel ons twee nuwe skoring teknike. Vir stabiliteit verleng ons die voorheen gedefinieerde maat met 'n normaliseerde Flicker in ons werk. Ons voorstel ook 'n nuwe middel van ouer maat. 'n Vorige weergawe van SLTev was gebruik in die IWSLT 2020 deel taak. Ook is 'n groei versameling van toets datastelle direk toeganklik deur SLTev verskaf vir stelsel evaluering vergelykbaar oor papiere.", 'am': 'የመኪን ትርጉም (MT) ጥሩ በብዙ ዐሥር ዓመታት የተመረጠው ነው፡፡ መግለጫ የውይይቱን ለመሞላ SLTev፣ የSLT መፍታት በተከፈተ የኩነቶች ዕቃ እናደርጋለን፡፡ SLTev በጊዜው-stamped ጽሑፍ እና ትርጓሜ በተመሳሳይ ቋንቋ ላይ የተደረገው የSLT አማራጆች ውጤት፣ ቅድሚያ እና የአካላዊ ቋንቋ ጥሩ እና የአፍላጎት ግንኙነት ያሳያል፡፡ ለብልሃት፣ የ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.ለ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ. For latency, we propose two new scoring techniques.  ለጸጥታ፣ የቀድሞው በተለየው የፊልኪር ሥርዓት በሥራችን የምንጨምር ነው፡፡ አዲስ የሽማግሌ መጠቀሚያ እናሳልጋለን፡፡ በIWSLT 2020 የተካፈለ ስራ ውስጥ የSLTev ፊደል የተጠቃሚ ክፍል ተጠቃሚ ነበር፡፡ ደግሞም SLTev በቀዳሚ የሚገኘው የድምፅ ዳታዎችን ማሰብሰብ በጋዜጠቶች ሁሉ ለሚተያያየው የድምፅ ማስታወቂያ ነው፡፡', 'tr': "Makin terjime (MT) kwaliteti birnäçe ýyldan bäri awtomatik deňlenýär Sözgüliler Dil terjime (SLT), esp.we olaryň ýene-de bir kriteriýa düşünmeli bolsa we standart deňleme prosesi ýok we ullanýan esbap zolakynyň içine ýok. Boşluky doldurmak üçin SLTev'i, SLT'i döwletlendirmek üçin a çyk-kaynakly açyk täsiri geliştirdik. SLTev SLT kandidýasynyň çykyşynyň keyfiýeti, latensi we stability baglanyşyny wagtyň stampelyk we referens terjimesine maksadyň diline daýan ýar. Görnüşlik üçin biz sacreBLEU-a ynanýarlýarys. HR ýa-da BLEU ýaly MT deňleme ölçülerini saýlaýar. Soňky üçin biz iki täze tekniki teklip berýäris. Durjalyk üçin, öňki takyk edilen ölçümleri Flicker'iň işimizde düzenli bir şekilde uzatdyrys. Biz hem uly çöplüklerden täze bir üýtgetmegi teklip edip görýäris. SLTev'iň öňki sany IWSLT 2020'iň paylaşyk işinde ulanyldy. Şimdiň üçin SLTev tarapyndan elýeterli test sanlarynyň ýygnak bilen sistemiň kagyzlaryň üstünde karmaşgalan deňlenmesi üçin üýtgedildi.", 'hy': 'Մեքենայի թարգմանման (MT) որակի ավտոմատիկ գնահատումը ուսումնասիրել է մի քանի տասնամյակների ընթացքում: Խոսվող լեզվի թարգմանություն (ՍԼԹ), օրինակ, երբ միաժամանակ, պետք է հաշվի առնեն ավելացնող հանգամանքներ և չունի ստանդարտ գնահատման գործընթաց և լայնորեն օգտագործված գործիքների շարք: To fill the gap, we develop SLTev, an open-source tool for assessing SLT in a comprehensive way.  ՍԼԹԵՎ զեկույց է տալիս թեկնածու արտադրության որակը, ուշացումը և կայունությունը, հիմնված ժամանակի վրա նշված թարգմանության և հաղորդակցման թարգմանության վրա նպատակային լեզու: Որպես որակ, մենք հիմնված ենք Սուրբ ԲԼԵՎ-ի վրա, որը տրամադրում է ՄԹ-ի գնահատման միջոցներ, ինչպիսիք են ՔՌՖ կամ ԲԼԵՎ: Վերջին ժամանակի համար մենք առաջարկում ենք երկու նոր գնահատման մեթոդ: Անկայունության համար մենք ընդլայնում ենք նախկինում սահմանափակված չափումները նորմալ Ֆլիքերի միջոցով մեր աշխատանքում: Մենք նաև առաջարկում ենք հին չափումների նոր միջինը: ՍԼԹԵՎ նախաձեռնական տարբերակը օգտագործվել է IwSԼT 2020-ի ընդհանուր խնդրում: Ավելին, ավելի շատ փորձարկումների տվյալներ են հավաքում, որոնք անմիջապես հասանելի են ՍԼԹԵՎ-ի կողմից, որպեսզի համակարգը գնահատվի, որը համեմատուկ է թղթերի միջև:', 'bn': 'বেশ কয়েক দশক ধরে মেশিন অনুবাদ (এমটি) মানের স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে তদন্ত করা হয়েছে। ভাষার অনুবাদ (এসএলটি), এপি. যখন একই সাথে সাথে যুক্ত থাকে, সেখানে অতিরিক্ত মীমাংসা বিবেচনা করা দরকার এবং স্থান্ডার্ডার মুক্তি প্রক্রিয়া  এসএলটিকে সম্পূর্ণ ভাবে মানার জন্য আমরা এসএলটিভের একটি উন্মুক্ত সোর্স টুল উন্নয়ন করি। এসএলটেভ ট্রান্সপ্রার্থীর মান, সামান্য এবং স্থায়ীতিতে একটি এসএলটি প্রার্থী আউটপুটের সংবাদ প্রদান করেছেন টাইম-স্ট্যাপ মানের জন্য আমরা স্যাক্রেবিলুর উপর নির্ভর করি যা এমটি মূল্যায়নের পদক্ষেপ যেমন ক্রিএফ বা বিলিউ। সম্প্রতি আমরা দুই নতুন স্কোরিং প্রযুক্তি প্রস্তাব করি। স্থিতির জন্য, আমরা আগের সংশোধনীয় পদক্ষেপ প্রসারিত করি আমাদের কাজে একটি স্বাভাবিক ফ্লিকারের সাথে। আমরা পুরোনো পদক্ষেপের প্রস্তাব করি। IWSLT ২০২০ শেয়ার কর্মসূচিতে SLTev এর প্রাথমিক সংস্করণ ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে। এছাড়াও, এসএলটেভ-এর দ্বারা সরাসরি প্রবেশযোগ্য পরীক্ষা ডাটাসেটের সংগ্রহ সিস্টেম মূল্যায়নের জন্য প্রদান করা হয়েছে।', 'bs': 'Automatska procjena kvalitete prevoda mašine (MT) istražena je tijekom nekoliko decenija. Prevod govornog jezika (SLT), esp. kada istovremeno, mora razmotriti dodatne kriterije i nema standardnu procjenu i široko korištenu instrumentsku kutiju. Da bi napunili prazninu, razvijemo SLTev, alat otvorenog izvora za procjenu SLT-a na sveobuhvatan način. SLTev izvještava kvalitet, latenciju i stabilnost proizvoda kandidata SLT-a na temelju transkripta i referentnog prevoda na ciljni jezik. Za kvalitet se oslanjamo na svetu BLEU koja pruža mjere procjene MT-a poput chrF ili BLEU. Za latenciju predlažemo dvije nove tehnike izvlačenja. Za stabilnost, proširimo prethodno definirane mjere sa normalizovanom Flickerom u našem poslu. Također predlažemo novu prosječnost starijih mjera. Preliminarna verzija SLTev je korištena u zajedničkom zadatku IWSLT 2020. Osim toga, rastuća kolekcija testnih seta podataka koje je direktno dostupna SLTev pruža se za procjenu sustava usporednom preko papira.', 'ca': "L'evaluació automàtica de la qualitat de la traducció màquina (MT) ha estat investigada durant diverses dècades. La traducció de llenguatge parlat (SLT), per exemple, quan és simultànea, necessita considerar criteris adicionals i no té un procediment d'evaluació estàndard i un conjunt d'eines generalment utilitzat. Per omplir la diferència, desenvolupem SLTev, una eina de codi obert per avaluar SLT d'una manera completa. SLTev relata la qualitat, la latencia i l'estabilitat d'una producció de candidats SLT basada en la transcripció temporal i la traducció de referència a un llenguatge d'objectiu. Per a la qualitat, confiem en la BLEU sagrada que proporciona mesures d'evaluació MT com el CRF o el BLEU. Per a la latencia, proposem dues noves tècniques de puntuació. Per a estabilitat, estendem les mesures anteriorment definides amb un Flicker normalitzat a la nostra feina. We also propose a new averaging of older measures.  Una versió preliminar de SLTev va ser utilitzada en la tasca compartida IWSLT 2020. A més, una col·lecció creixent de conjunts de dades de prova accessibles directament per SLTev es proporciona per a l'evaluació del sistema comparable a través de documents.", 'sq': 'Automatic evaluation of Machine Translation (MT) quality has been investigated over several decades.  Përkthimi i gjuhës së folur (SLT), sp. kur është i njëkohëshëm, duhet të konsiderojë kritere shtesë dhe nuk ka një procedurë standarte vlerësimi dhe një paketë mjete të përdorura gjerësisht. Për të mbushur boshllëkun, ne zhvillojmë SLTev, një mjet burimi i hapur për vlerësimin e SLT në një mënyrë tërësore. SLTev raporton cilësinë, vonesën dhe stabilitetin e një daljeje të kandidatit SLT bazuar në transkriptin me kohë dhe përkthimin e referimit në një gjuhë objektive. Për cilësi, ne mbështetemi në BLEU të shenjtë që ofron masa vlerësimi MT të tilla si chrF apo BLEU. Për vonesë, ne propozojmë dy teknika të reja pikërimi. Për stabilitetin, zgjerojmë masat e përcaktuara më parë me një Flicker të normalizuar në punën tonë. Ne propozojmë gjithashtu një mesatare të re masash më të vjetra. Një version paraprak i SLTev u përdorë në detyrën e përbashkët IWSLT 2020. Përveç kësaj, një mbledhje në rritje e grupeve të të dhënave të provave të përdorura drejtpërdrejt nga SLTev janë ofruar për vlerësimin e sistemit të krahasueshëm nëpër dokumente.', 'cs': 'Automatické hodnocení kvality strojového překladu (MT) bylo zkoumáno po několik desetiletí. Překlad mluveného jazyka (SLT), zejména v případě simultánní, musí zvážit další kritéria a nemá standardní postup hodnocení a široce používanou sadu nástrojů. Abychom tuto mezeru vyplnili, vyvinuli jsme SLTev, open source nástroj pro komplexní hodnocení SLT. SLTev hlásí kvalitu, latenci a stabilitu výstupu kandidáta SLT na základě časového přepisu a referenčního překladu do cílového jazyka. Pro kvalitu spoléháme na sacreBLEU, která poskytuje MT hodnotící opatření, jako je chrF nebo BLEU. Pro latenci navrhujeme dvě nové bodovací techniky. Pro stabilitu v naší práci rozšiřujeme dříve definovaná měřítka o normalizovaný Flicker. Navrhujeme také nové průměrování starších opatření. Předběžná verze SLTev byla použita ve sdíleném úkolu IWSLT 2020. Kromě toho je poskytována rostoucí sbírka testovacích dat přímo přístupných SLTev pro vyhodnocování systému srovnatelné napříč články.', 'et': 'Masintõlke kvaliteedi automaatset hindamist on uuritud mitme aastakümne jooksul. Kõnekeelne tõlge (SLT), eriti samaaegselt, peab kaaluma täiendavaid kriteeriume ning sellel puudub standardne hindamismenetlus ja laialdaselt kasutatav tööriistakomplekt. Selle lünga täitmiseks töötame välja SLTev, avatud lähtekoodiga vahendi, mille abil hinnatakse SLTevi terviklikult. SLTev annab teada SLT kandidaadi väljundi kvaliteedi, latentsuse ja stabiilsuse, tuginedes ajatempliga transkriptsiooni- ja viitetõlkele sihtkeelde. Kvaliteedi saavutamiseks tugineme sacreBLEUle, mis pakub MT hindamismeetmeid nagu chrF või BLEU. Latentsuse jaoks pakume välja kaks uut punktisüsteemi. Stabiilsuse huvides laiendame oma töös varem määratletud meetmeid normaliseeritud Flickeriga. Samuti teeme ettepaneku vanemate meetmete uueks keskmiseks arvutamiseks. SLTevi esialgset versiooni kasutati IWSLT 2020 jagatud ülesandes. Lisaks sellele on SLTevile vahetult kättesaadavate testiandmekogumite üha suurem kogum, et süsteemi hindamine oleks võrreldav kõigis dokumentides.', 'fi': 'Konekäännöksen laadun automaattista arviointia on tutkittu useiden vuosikymmenten ajan. Puhutun kielen käännös (SLT), erityisesti silloin, kun se on samanaikainen, on otettava huomioon lisäkriteerit, eikä sillä ole vakioarviointimenettelyä eikä laajalti käytettyä työkalupakkia. Puuton täyttämiseksi kehitämme SLTevin, avoimen lähdekoodin työkalun SLTevin kokonaisvaltaiseen arviointiin. SLTev raportoi SLT-ehdokkaan tuotoksen laadun, viiveen ja vakauden aikaleimatun transkriptin ja viitekäännöksen perusteella kohdekielelle. Luotamme laatuun sacreBLEU:hun, joka tarjoaa MT-arviointitoimenpiteitä, kuten chrF:n tai BLEU:n. Latenssia varten ehdotamme kahta uutta pisteytystekniikkaa. Vakauden vuoksi laajennamme työssämme aiemmin määriteltyjä toimenpiteitä normalisoitulla välähdyksellä. Ehdotamme myös vanhojen toimenpiteiden uutta keskiarvoa. SLTevin alustavaa versiota käytettiin IWSLT 2020:n yhteisessä tehtävässä. Lisäksi SLTevin suoraan saataville tulevien testiaineistojen kokoelma kasvaa, jotta järjestelmän arviointi voidaan vertailla eri papereissa.', 'az': "Machine Translation (MT) keyfiyyətinin otomatik değerlendirməsi bircə on il ərzində xəbərdar edildi. Spoken Dil Çeviri (SLT), esp. eyni zamanda, əlavə kriteriləri düşünmək lazımdır və standart değerlendirmə proqramı və geniş istifadə edilən araç çubuğu yoxdur. Boşluğu doldurmaq üçün SLTev'i, a çıq-kaynaq vasitəsilə tükənməz bir yolla SLT değerlendirmək üçün hazırlamışıq. SLTev zaman-stamped transkriptlərin və məqsəd dilinə dayanan SLT kandidātu çıxışının keyfiyyətini, latencini və stabilliyini xəbər verir. Qıymetlik üçün, biz müqəddəs BLEU-ə təvəkkül edirik ki, chrF və BLEU kimi MT değerlendirmə ölçülərini təmin edir. Sonradan iki yeni scoring tekniki təklif edirik. Stabiliyyət üçün, əvvəlcə belə tanımlanmış ölçüləri işlərimizdə normal Flicker ilə genişləyirik. Biz də əvvəlki ölçülərdən yeni bir dəyişiklik təklif edirik. SLTev'in ilk versiyonu IWSLT 2020 paylaşılan işlərdə istifadə edildi. Daha sonra, SLTev tərəfindən müəyyən edilən sınama verilən qurğularının artırılması sistem değerlendirməsi kağıtların arasında müəyyən edilə bilər.", 'he': 'Automatic evaluation of Machine Translation (MT) quality has been investigated over several decades.  תורגם וסונכרן ע"י Qsubs מצוות כדי למלא את הפער, אנחנו מפתחים SLTev, כלי מקור פתוח להעריך SLT בדרך כללית. SLTev מדווח על איכות, לאטנציה וביציבות של יציאה מועמדת SLT מבוססת על התרשם עם סימנים זמנים ותרגום התייחסות לשפה המטרה. For quality, we rely on sacreBLEU which provides MT evaluation measures such as chrF or BLEU.  לאחרונה, אנחנו מציעים שתי טכניקות ניקוי חדשות. For stability, we extend the previously defined measures with a normalized Flicker in our work.  We also propose a new averaging of older measures.  גרסה קודמית של SLTev השתמשה במשימה משותפת IWSLT 2020. Moreover, a growing collection of test datasets directly accessible by SLTev are provided for system evaluation comparable across papers.', 'sk': 'Avtomatsko ocenjevanje kakovosti strojnega prevajanja (MT) je bilo raziskano že več desetletij. Prevajanje govorjenega jezika (SLT), zlasti pri hkratnem prevajanju, mora upoštevati dodatna merila in nima standardnega postopka ocenjevanja in široko uporabljenega orodja. Za zapolnitev vrzeli razvijamo SLTev, odprtokodno orodje za celovito ocenjevanje SLT. SLTev poroča o kakovosti, latenci in stabilnosti izhoda kandidata SLT na podlagi časovnega žigosanega prepisa in referenčnega prevoda v ciljni jezik. Za kakovost se zanašamo na sacreBLEU, ki zagotavlja ocenjevalne ukrepe MT, kot sta chrF ali BLEU. Za latenco predlagamo dve novi tehniki ocenjevanja. Za stabilnost razširimo predhodno opredeljene ukrepe z normaliziranim Flicker v svojem delu. Predlagamo tudi novo povprečje starejših ukrepov. Predhodna različica SLTeva je bila uporabljena v skupni nalogi IWSLT 2020. Poleg tega je vse večja zbirka preskusnih podatkov, ki so neposredno dostopni SLTev, zagotovljena za ocenjevanje sistema, primerljivo v vseh dokumentih.', 'ha': "An jarraba ƙaddara na Tsarin Tarjima na Kifin (MT) cikin shekara taki guda. @ info: whatsthis Dõmin cika gaura, za'a buɗe SLTeV, wata zance mai buɗewa zuwa kwamfyutan da za'a iya ƙayyade SLT cikin hanya guda. @ item license Ga sifa, Munã dõgara ga sakreBLEU, wanda ke samar da MT kan qiymatãwa kamar chrF ko BLEU. Ga na farko, za'a buƙata misalin kodi biyu. Ga tabbatarwa, za mu cire takwaran da aka ƙayyade ta a gabãni da Flickeren wanda ya zama mai normal a cikin aikinmu. Kayya, tuna goyi wani taƙaita na tsohon. @ info: status Da haka, an ba da koɗabi'in da za'a ƙara samun mutane na jarrabi da aka iya haɗa shi dira da SLTeV don a ƙayyade kimar system da kwamfyuta kowace takardar.", 'jv': 'Advanci kapan tanggal nggunakake Universe (MT) kang dipunanggunakake karo akeh akeh sing dumadhi. ProgressBarUpdates kanggo ngilangno gap, kita diwehke SLT, alat Open-source kanggo ngerasakno SLT ngono akeh barang akeh SLTekv menehi nggawe kalite, terjenengan, lan stabil kapan mulai nggawe SLT supoyo nggawe tarjamahan kanggo nakope tarjamahan lan balikat tarjamahan kanggo ngengalakno. Nyong ngomong kaliwat, kéné iso nglanggar wigatining \'sak-bleb\' sing nyelehake MT nyong, koyo ngono \'krF\' yo ngono \'bleb\' Nyong ngomong, kéné ngerasakno teknik sing dibutuhke Daftar stabil, kita luwih aplikasi kanggo masa sing luwih apik gedhéwé karo un pilik sing katêpakan karo hal-aké awak dhéwé. Awak dhéwé mulai nggawe sistem sing gawe nggawe ngejer-sistem sing luwih apik. Versi perusahaan kelas sing SLTekv iso nggambar nggo task IWSLT 2020 Laptop" and "Desktop', 'bo': 'འདིའི་ནང་གི་མེ་འཁོར་གྱི་ཚིག Spoken Language Translation (SLT), esp. when simultaneous, needs to consider additional criteria and do not have a standard evaluation procedure and a widely used toolkit. བར་སྟོང་འདི་བཀགས་དགོས་ན། ང་ཚོས་SLTev་ལ་ཁ་ཕྱེས་ཁུངས་ཀྱི་ལག་ཆ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས། SLT ལ་ཡོངས་བསྡུར་ཐབས་ཤིག་ལ་ཡོད། SLTev reports the quality, latency, and stability of an SLT candidate output based on the time-stamped transcript and reference translation into a target language. སྤྱིར་བཏང་ན། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་དུས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་མཁན་ཉེན་ཁ་ཡུལ། འཛམ་གླིང་ལ། འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྙིགས་འཛིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གསར་བ་གཉིས་བསམ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འཛམ་གླིང་བདེ་སྡོད་པར་ང་ཚོས་དུས་འདོད་པར་སྔོན་གྱིས་ང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་Flicker་གི་ཚད་ལྟར ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་ཚད་རྙིང་པ་ཞིག་གི་སྐྱེལ་ཚད་གསར་བ་ཞིག་གི་བསམ་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། SLTev ཡི་སྔོན་མའི་ཐོན་རིམ་འདི་IWSLT 2020་མཉམ་དུ་སྤྱོད་སྤྱད་ཡོད་པ SLTev ཡིས་ཐད་ཀར་སྤྱོད་རུང་བའི་བརྟག'}
{'en': 'A Dashboard for Mitigating the COVID-19 Misinfodemic', 'ar': 'لوحة معلومات للتخفيف من حدة انتشار فيروس كورونا المستجد COVID-19', 'es': 'Un panel de control para mitigar la desinfodemia de COVID-19', 'fr': 'Un tableau de bord pour atténuer la désinfopdémie COVID-19', 'pt': 'Um painel para mitigar a desinfodemia COVID-19', 'ja': '新型コロナウイルスの感染拡大を緩和するためのダッシュボード', 'zh': '以纾COVID-19息错误信息之仪表板', 'ru': 'Информационная панель для смягчения последствий эпидемии COVID-19', 'hi': 'कोविड-19 मिसइन्फोडैमिक को कम करने के लिए एक डैशबोर्ड', 'ga': 'Deais chun Mífhaisnéis COVID-19 a Mhaolú', 'el': 'Ένας πίνακας ελέγχου για την άμβλυνση της παραπληροφόρησης του COVID-19', 'ka': 'COVID- 19 Misinfodemic', 'hu': 'Irányítópult a COVID-19 félreértékenység enyhítésére', 'it': 'Una dashboard per mitigare il misinfodemico COVID-19', 'kk': 'COVID- 19 түрлі мәліметті шектеу үшін сұлбалау бордыName', 'lt': 'COVID-19 misinfodemijos mažinimo darbotvarkė', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'കോവിഡി- 19 മിസ്ഫികോഡിമിക്ക് മീറ്റിക്കാനുള്ള ഒരു ഡാഷ്ബോര്\u200dഡ്Name', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Dashboard biex jittaffa l-COVID-19 Misinfodemika', 'mn': 'COVID-19 Misinfodemic', 'ro': 'Un tablou de bord pentru atenuarea dezinfodemiei COVID-19', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Dashboard do łagodzenia misinfodemii COVID-19', 'sr': 'Dashboard za mijenjanje COVID-19 Misinfodemike', 'si': 'COVID-19 Misinfo', 'so': 'Mitigating the COVID-19 Misinfodemic', 'sv': 'En instrumentpanel för att mildra COVID-19 misinfodemic', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'COVID-19 Misinfodemic', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một bản thủ chính để giải quyết định rượu VID-19 MisTrudemic.', 'bg': 'Табло за управление за смекчаване на Мисифодемик', 'da': 'Et dashboard til afhjælpning af COVID-19 misinfodemic', 'nl': 'Een dashboard voor het verminderen van de COVID-19 Misinfodemic', 'hr': 'Dashboard za ublažavanje COVID-19 Misinfodemičkog', 'de': 'Ein Dashboard zur Bekämpfung der COVID-19 Misinfodemie', 'ko': '코로나 오전 완화 계기판', 'id': 'Dashboard untuk Melawan COVID-19 Misinfodemic', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Boko la kupunguza vibaya vya COVID-19', 'tr': 'COVID-19 Misinfodemik üçin bir Dashboard', 'af': "'n Dashboard for Mitigating the COVID- 19 Misinfodemic", 'sq': 'Një tabelë për lehtësimin e COVID-19 Misinfodemic', 'am': 'COVID-19 Misinfodemic', 'hy': 'COVID-19-ի սխալ ինֆոդեմիայի խուսափման տախտակը', 'az': 'COVID-19 Misinfodemic', 'bn': 'কভিড-১৯ মিসাইডমিকের জন্য একটি ড্যাশবোর্ড', 'bs': 'Dashboard za ublažavanje COVID-19 Misinfodemike', 'ca': 'Un quadre per Mitigar la Misinfodèmia COVID-19', 'cs': 'Řídicí panel pro zmírnění misinfodemie COVID-19', 'et': 'Armatuurlaud COVID-19 Misinfodemic leevendamiseks', 'fi': 'Kojelauta COVID-19:n hillitsemiseksi Misinfodemic', 'jv': 'A Panelbar for mitigating the COMVD-19 Misinfo', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'לוח דיסק להקל את COVID-19 Misinfodemic', 'sk': 'Nadzorna plošča za ublažitev COVID-19 Misinfodemic', 'bo': 'COVID-19 Misinfodemic་ལ་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་སྡེར་གྱི་Dashboard for Mitigating the COVID-19'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the current milestones achieved in our ongoing project that aims to understand the surveillance of, impact of and intervention on COVID-19 misinfodemic on Twitter. Specifically, it introduces a public dashboard which, in addition to displaying case counts in an interactive map and a navigational panel, also provides some unique features not found in other places. Particularly, the dashboard uses a curated catalog of COVID-19 related facts and debunks of misinformation, and it displays the most prevalent information from the catalog among Twitter users in user-selected U.S. geographic regions. The paper explains how to use BERT models to match tweets with the facts and misinformation and to detect their stance towards such information. The paper also discusses the results of preliminary experiments on analyzing the spatio-temporal spread of misinformation.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة المعالم الحالية التي تم تحقيقها في مشروعنا المستمر الذي يهدف إلى فهم مراقبة وتأثير والتدخل على COVID-19 الخاطئ على تويتر. على وجه التحديد ، فإنه يقدم لوحة معلومات عامة والتي ، بالإضافة إلى عرض عدد الحالات في خريطة تفاعلية ولوحة تنقل ، توفر أيضًا بعض الميزات الفريدة غير الموجودة في أماكن أخرى. على وجه الخصوص ، تستخدم لوحة القيادة كتالوجًا منظمًا للحقائق ذات الصلة بـ COVID-19 وكشف المعلومات المضللة ، وتعرض المعلومات الأكثر انتشارًا من الكتالوج بين مستخدمي Twitter في المناطق الجغرافية التي يختارها المستخدم في الولايات المتحدة. تشرح الورقة كيفية استخدام نماذج بيرت لمطابقة التغريدات بالحقائق والمعلومات المضللة وكشف موقفهم تجاه هذه المعلومات. تناقش الورقة أيضًا نتائج التجارب الأولية لتحليل الانتشار المكاني والزماني للمعلومات المضللة.', 'es': 'Este documento describe los hitos actuales alcanzados en nuestro proyecto en curso que tiene como objetivo comprender la vigilancia, el impacto y la intervención en torno a la desinfodemia de COVID-19 en Twitter. Específicamente, introduce un panel público que, además de mostrar el recuento de casos en un mapa interactivo y un panel de navegación, también proporciona algunas características únicas que no se encuentran en otros lugares. En particular, el panel utiliza un catálogo seleccionado de datos relacionados con el COVID-19 y desacredita la desinformación, y muestra la información más frecuente del catálogo entre los usuarios de Twitter en regiones geográficas de EE. UU. seleccionadas por los usuarios. El documento explica cómo usar los modelos BERT para hacer coincidir los tuits con los hechos y la desinformación y para detectar su postura hacia dicha información. El artículo también analiza los resultados de experimentos preliminares sobre el análisis de la propagación espacio-temporal de la desinformación.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit les étapes actuelles franchies dans notre projet en cours qui vise à comprendre la surveillance, l'impact et l'intervention de la misinfodémie COVID-19 sur Twitter. Plus précisément, il introduit un tableau de bord public qui, en plus d'afficher le nombre de cas sur une carte interactive et un panneau de navigation, fournit également des fonctionnalités uniques que l'on ne trouve pas ailleurs. En particulier, le tableau de bord utilise un catalogue organisé de faits liés à la COVID-19 et de démystifications de désinformation, et il affiche les informations les plus courantes du catalogue parmi les utilisateurs de Twitter dans les régions géographiques américaines sélectionnées par les utilisateurs. Le document explique comment utiliser les modèles BERT pour faire correspondre les tweets aux faits et à la désinformation et pour détecter leur position à l'égard de ces informations. L'article traite également des résultats d'expériences préliminaires sur l'analyse de la propagation spatio-temporelle de la désinformation.", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve os marcos atuais alcançados em nosso projeto em andamento que visa entender a vigilância, o impacto e a intervenção na desinfodemia do COVID-19 no Twitter. Especificamente, ele apresenta um painel público que, além de exibir contagens de casos em um mapa interativo e um painel de navegação, também fornece alguns recursos exclusivos não encontrados em outros lugares. Particularmente, o painel usa um catálogo com curadoria de fatos relacionados ao COVID-19 e desinformação de desinformação, e exibe as informações mais prevalentes do catálogo entre os usuários do Twitter em regiões geográficas dos EUA selecionadas pelo usuário. O artigo explica como usar os modelos BERT para combinar tweets com fatos e informações erradas e detectar sua posição em relação a essas informações. O artigo também discute os resultados de experimentos preliminares na análise da disseminação espaço-temporal da desinformação.', 'ja': '本稿では、Twitterでの新型コロナウイルス感染症（ COVID -19 ）のミスインフォデミックに対する監視、影響、および介入を理解することを目的とした現在進行中のプロジェクトで達成されているマイルストーンについて説明します。具体的には、インタラクティブマップとナビゲーションパネルにケースカウントを表示するだけでなく、他の場所にはないいくつかのユニークな機能を提供する公開ダッシュボードを導入しています。特に、ダッシュボードはCOVID -19関連の事実と誤った情報のデバンクのキュレートされたカタログを使用し、ユーザーが選択した米国の地理的地域のTwitterユーザーの間でカタログから最も一般的な情報を表示します。この論文では、BERTモデルを使用して、ツイートを事実や誤った情報と照合し、そのような情報に対するスタンスを検出する方法を説明しています。また，誤情報の空間的・時間的な広がりを解析するための予備実験の結果についても論じた。', 'zh': '本文述项目之里程碑,在知Twitter上COVID-19错误信息之监测,干预其事。 具体来说引入一公共仪表板,除交互式地图、导航面板中示例数外,供他处所不得者。 仪表板用COVID-19事、错误信息精选目录,并于用户所择美国地理之Twitter用户,最为周遍。 本文解释如何用BERT模将推文与事实与错误信息相匹,并检其信息。 本文犹论剖析错误信息空传初实验。', 'hi': 'यह पत्र हमारी चल रही परियोजना में हासिल किए गए वर्तमान मील के पत्थर का वर्णन करता है जिसका उद्देश्य ट्विटर पर कोविड -19 मिसइन्फोडमिक की निगरानी, प्रभाव और हस्तक्षेप को समझना है। विशेष रूप से, यह एक सार्वजनिक डैशबोर्ड का परिचय देता है, जो एक इंटरैक्टिव मानचित्र और एक नेविगेशनल पैनल में केस काउंट प्रदर्शित करने के अलावा, कुछ अद्वितीय विशेषताएं भी प्रदान करता है जो अन्य स्थानों पर नहीं पाए जाते हैं। विशेष रूप से, डैशबोर्ड कोविड -19 से संबंधित तथ्यों और गलत सूचनाओं के खंडन की एक क्यूरेटेड कैटलॉग का उपयोग करता है, और यह उपयोगकर्ता-चयनित अमेरिकी भौगोलिक क्षेत्रों में ट्विटर उपयोगकर्ताओं के बीच कैटलॉग से सबसे प्रचलित जानकारी प्रदर्शित करता है। पेपर बताता है कि तथ्यों और गलत जानकारी के साथ ट्वीट्स का मिलान करने और ऐसी जानकारी के प्रति उनके रुख का पता लगाने के लिए BERT मॉडल का उपयोग कैसे किया जाए। पेपर गलत सूचना के स्पैटिओ-टेम्पोरल प्रसार का विश्लेषण करने पर प्रारंभिक प्रयोगों के परिणामों पर भी चर्चा करता है।', 'ru': 'В этом документе описываются текущие этапы, достигнутые в нашем текущем проекте, который направлен на понимание эпиднадзора, воздействия и вмешательства в связи с мизинфодемией COVID-19 в Twitter. В частности, в нем представлена общедоступная информационная панель, которая, помимо отображения количества случаев на интерактивной карте и навигационной панели, также обеспечивает некоторые уникальные функции, не встречающиеся в других местах. В частности, информационная панель использует курируемый каталог фактов, связанных с COVID-19, и развенчания дезинформации, и отображает самую распространенную информацию из каталога среди пользователей Twitter в выбранных пользователями географических регионах США. В статье объясняется, как использовать модели BERT для сопоставления твитов с фактами и дезинформацией, а также для определения их отношения к такой информации. В работе также обсуждаются результаты предварительных экспериментов по анализу пространственно-временного распространения дезинформации.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar na garspriocanna reatha atá bainte amach inár dtionscadal leanúnach a bhfuil sé mar aidhm aige faireachas agus tionchar agus idirghabháil ar mhífhaisnéis COVID-19 a thuiscint ar Twitter. Go sonrach, tugann sé isteach painéal poiblí a sholáthraíonn roinnt gnéithe uathúla nach bhfuarthas in áiteanna eile, chomh maith le háirimh na gcásanna a thaispeáint ar léarscáil idirghníomhach agus ar phainéal loingseoireachta. Go háirithe, úsáideann an painéal catalóg coimeádta d’fhíorais a bhaineann le COVID-19 agus bailchríocha faisnéise míchearta, agus taispeánann sé an fhaisnéis is forleithne ón gcatalóg i measc úsáideoirí Twitter i réigiúin gheografacha na SA a roghnaíonn úsáideoirí. Mínítear sa pháipéar conas samhlacha BERT a úsáid chun tweets a mheaitseáil leis na fíricí agus leis an eolas mícheart agus chun a seasamh i leith na faisnéise sin a bhrath. Pléann an páipéar freisin torthaí na réamh-turgnaimh ar anailís a dhéanamh ar scaipeadh spásúil-ama na mífhaisnéise.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი აღწერს მიმდინარე გარეშე პროექტში, რომელიც უნდა გავიგოთ, შემდეგ და ინტერგენციის შესახებ COVID-19 გარეშე განსხვავებაში. განსაკუთრებულია, ის ჩვენებს სახელსაწყოფილი დიაქბონი, რომელიც ინტერაქტიური კაპონიში და ნავაგრაციო პანელში გამოჩვენება სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა ფუნქციები განსაკუთრებით, დიაშბორდის გამოყენება COVID-19 შესახებ დაკავშირებული ფაქტების კატალოგის და შეცდომარების დებონკების შესახებ, და ის ჩვენებს საკუთრებით უფრო გასაკუთრებული ინფორმაცია კატალოგიდან Twitter-ის გამოყ ბერტის მოდელების გამოყენება, როგორ გამოყენება ბერტის მოდელების გამოყენება, როგორ გამოყენება ტაკტებით და შეცდომარებით, და როგორც გამოყენება მათი სტან გვერდის შესახებ შესახებ პირველური ექსპერიმენტების შედეგების შედეგების შესახებ, რომელიც განაზღვრება სისტემალური-გერმალური გაფარდება შეცდომის', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a jelenlegi mérföldköveket a folyamatban lévő projektünkben, amelynek célja, hogy megértse a COVID-19 félinformámiás felügyeletét, hatását és beavatkozását a Twitteren. Konkrétan egy nyilvános irányítópultot vezet be, amely az esetszámok interaktív térképen és navigációs panelben való megjelenítése mellett néhány olyan egyedi funkciót is biztosít, amelyek nem találhatók más helyeken. Az irányítópult különösen a COVID-19-hez kapcsolódó tények és a félrevezető információk hibáinak összeállított katalógusát használja, és megjeleníti a katalógusból származó legelterjedtebb információkat a felhasználó által kiválasztott amerikai földrajzi régiókban. A tanulmány elmagyarázza, hogyan lehet BERT modelleket használni a tweetek összehangolására a tényekkel és a téves információkkal, és hogyan lehet felismerni az ilyen információkkal szembeni álláspontjukat. A tanulmány a félinformáció tér-időbeli terjedésének elemzésére irányuló előzetes kísérletek eredményeit is tárgyalja.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει τα τρέχοντα ορόσημα που επιτεύχθηκαν στο τρέχον πρότζεκτ μας, το οποίο στοχεύει στην κατανόηση της παρακολούθησης, του αντίκτυπου και της παρέμβασης στην παραπληροφόρηση του στο Twitter. Συγκεκριμένα, εισάγει έναν δημόσιο πίνακα ελέγχου ο οποίος, εκτός από την εμφάνιση αριθμών περιπτώσεων σε έναν διαδραστικό χάρτη και έναν πίνακα πλοήγησης, παρέχει επίσης ορισμένα μοναδικά χαρακτηριστικά που δεν υπάρχουν σε άλλα μέρη. Ειδικότερα, ο πίνακας εργαλείων χρησιμοποιεί έναν επιμελημένο κατάλογο γεγονότων που σχετίζονται με το COVID-19 και αποσβέσεις παραπληροφόρησης και εμφανίζει τις πιο διαδεδομένες πληροφορίες από τον κατάλογο μεταξύ των χρηστών του σε επιλεγμένες από το χρήστη γεωγραφικές περιοχές των ΗΠΑ. Η εργασία εξηγεί πώς να χρησιμοποιήσετε μοντέλα BERT για να αντιστοιχίσετε τα tweets με τα γεγονότα και τις παραπληροφορίες και να εντοπίσετε τη στάση τους απέναντι σε αυτές τις πληροφορίες. Η εργασία συζητά επίσης τα αποτελέσματα προκαταρκτικών πειραμάτων για την ανάλυση της χωροχρονικής εξάπλωσης της παραπληροφόρησης.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз қолданыстағы жобамыздың қазіргі сәттерін таңдайды. Бұл қағаз Твиттерге COVID-19 деген дұрыс емес жұмыс істеу, қатынасын қарау, қатынасын түсінуге мақсатты. Сәйкес, ол интерактивті карта мен навигациялық панелінде үлкен- кіші сандарын көрсету үшін көпшілік планеталарды таңдайды. Бірақ басқа жерлерде бірнеше мүмкіндіктер табылмады. Әсіресе, таңбаша COVID- 19 қатынастық факттер мен жарамсыз түрлендіру дебюнктерінің қарсы каталогын қолданады. Бұл АҚШ географиялық аумақтарындағы Твиттер пайдаланушылардың каталогының ең үлкен мәліметін көрсетеді. Бұл қағаз BERT үлгілерін жалғыз және дұрыс түрлендіру үшін tweets үлгілеріне қалай пайдалануын түсіндіреді және олардың мәліметіне қатынасын анықтау үшін. Қағаз сондай-ақ бұл кезде мезгілдік түрлендірудің алдындағы тәжірибелердің нәтижесін талдайды.', 'mk': 'Овој документ ги опишува сегашните километри постигнати во нашиот тековен проект кој има за цел да го разбере надгледувањето на, влијанието на и интервенцијата на COVID-19 во погрешни инфодемии на Твитер. Специфично, истиот воведува јавна табла која, покрај прикажувањето на бројот на случаи на интерактивна мапа и навигациска табла, исто така обезбедува некои уникатни карактеристики кои не се пронајдени на други места. Особено, таблата користи куриран каталог на факти поврзани со COVID-19 и откривања на погрешни информации, и ја прикажува најпопуларната информација од каталогот помеѓу корисниците на Твитер во географските региони на САД избрани од корисниците. Во весникот се објаснува како да се користат BERT модели за да се совпаѓаат твитовите со фактите и погрешни информации и да се открие нивниот став кон ваквите информации. Документот, исто така, ги дискутира резултатите од прелиминарните експерименти за анализирање на просторотермоналното ширење на погрешни информации.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive gli attuali traguardi raggiunti nel nostro progetto in corso che mira a comprendere la sorveglianza, l'impatto e l'intervento su COVID-19 misinfodemic su Twitter. Nello specifico, introduce una dashboard pubblica che, oltre a visualizzare i numeri di casi in una mappa interattiva e un pannello di navigazione, fornisce anche alcune funzionalità uniche non presenti in altri luoghi. In particolare, la dashboard utilizza un catalogo curato di fatti correlati al COVID-19 e debunk di disinformazione, e visualizza le informazioni più diffuse dal catalogo tra gli utenti Twitter nelle regioni geografiche degli Stati Uniti selezionate dagli utenti. L'articolo spiega come utilizzare i modelli BERT per abbinare i tweet ai fatti e alla disinformazione e per rilevare la loro posizione nei confronti di tali informazioni. L'articolo discute anche i risultati di esperimenti preliminari sull'analisi della diffusione spazio-temporale della disinformazione.", 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ മൈല്\u200d കല്ലുകള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ നടക്കുന്ന പ്രോജക്റ്റില്\u200d നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്നത്, കോവിഡി-19 ല്\u200d തെറ്റാ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, അത് ഒരു പൊതു ഡാഷ്ബോര്\u200dഡിനെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. മറ്റു സ്ഥലങ്ങളില്\u200d കണ്ടെത്താത്ത കേസ് എണ്ണം കാണിക്കുന്നതിനും കൂടാതെ കേ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ഡാഷ്ബോര്\u200dഡ് കൊവിഡി-19 സംബന്ധിച്ച വാക്കുകളും തെറ്റായ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ തെറ്റുകളുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങളും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അത് തെരഞ്ഞെടുത് ആ പേപ്പറില്\u200d ബെര്\u200dട്ടി മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് എങ്ങനെയാണെന്ന് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നത് സത്യത്തോടും തെറ്റായ വിവരങ്ങളോടും പൊ The paper also discusses the results of preliminary experiments on analyzing the spatio-temporal spread of misinformation.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinami dabartiniai mūsų vykdomo projekto etapai, kuriais siekiama suprasti netinkamos informacijos apie COVID-19 Twitter priežiūrą, poveikį ir intervenciją. Konkrečiai, jame pateikiama viešoji prietaisų plokštelė, kurioje, be atvejų skaičiaus parodymo interaktyviame žemėlapyje ir navigacijos plokštelėje, taip pat pateikiami kai kurie unikalūs požymiai, nenustatyti kitose vietose. Visų pirma prietaiso lentelėje naudojamas pataisytas su COVID-19 susijusių faktų ir klaidingos informacijos atsiradimo katalogas ir jame pateikiama dažniausia informacija iš katalogo tarp Twitter naudotojų pasirinktuose JAV geografiniuose regionuose. Dokumente paaiškinama, kaip naudoti BERT modelius, siekiant suderinti tweetus su faktais ir neteisinga informacija, ir nustatyti jų požiūrį į tokią informaciją. Dokumente taip pat aptariami preliminarių eksperimentų dėl netinkamos informacijos erdvės ir laiko sklaidos analizės rezultatai.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi l-miri attwali miksuba fil-proġett li għaddej tagħna li għandu l-għan li jifhem is-sorveljanza, l-impatt u l-intervent fuq COVID-19 misinfodemiku fuq Twitter. B’mod speċifiku, tintroduċi dashboard pubbliku li, minbarra li juri l-għadd ta’ każijiet f’mappa interattiva u panel tan-navigazzjoni, jipprovdi wkoll xi karatteristiċi uniċi li ma jinstabux f’postijiet oħra. B’mod partikolari, id-dashboard juża katalgu kkurat ta’ fatti u żbalji relatati mal-COVID-19, u juri l-aktar informazzjoni prevalenti mill-katalgu fost l-utenti ta’ Twitter f’reġjuni ġeografiċi tal-Istati Uniti magħżula mill-utenti. Id-dokument jispjega kif jintużaw mudelli BERT biex iqabblu t-tweets mal-fatti u l-informazzjoni żbaljata u biex jinstabu l-pożizzjoni tagħhom lejn tali informazzjoni. Id-dokument jiddiskuti wkoll ir-riżultati ta’ esperimenti preliminari dwar l-analiżi tal-firxa spazjo-temporali ta’ informazzjoni ħażina.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний одоогийн төсөл дээр гарч ирсэн хамгийн сайхан тайлбаруудыг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ нь COVID-19 буруу сэтгэл хөдлөлийг Twitter дээр харах, нөлөөлдөг, нөлөөлдөг байдлыг ойлгох зорилготой. Тодорхой хэлбэл, энэ нь олон нийтийн цахим хуудас, интерактив газрын зураг болон судалгааны захирал дээр тооцоолж бусад газрын газрын хэмжээсүүдийг харуулдаг. Ялангуяа, цахим хуудас нь COVID-19 холбоотой үнэний, буруу хэлбэрийн дүгнэлтийг ашигладаг. Энэ нь АНУ-ын сонгогдсон газрын хэсэгт Twitter хэрэглэгчдийн каталогын хамгийн чухал мэдээллийг харуулдаг. БЕРТ загваруудыг хэрхэн хэрхэн хэрэглэх вэт болон буруу тодорхойлолтой холбоотой, тэдгээр мэдээллийн тухай бодит байдлыг олж мэдэхийг тайлбарладаг. Харин цаас нь мөн аль хэдийн туршилтын үр дүнг буруу хэлбэрийн орон зай-цаг хугацааны тархалтын талаар ярьдаг.', 'ms': 'This paper describes the current milestones achieved in our ongoing project that aims to understand the surveillance of, impact of and intervention on COVID-19 misinfodemic on Twitter.  Secara khusus, ia memperkenalkan papan pandang awam yang, selain memaparkan kiraan kes dalam peta interaktif dan panel navigasi, juga menyediakan beberapa ciri unik yang tidak ditemui di tempat lain. Terutama, papan papan papan papan papan papan papan menggunakan katalog terkurus fakta berkaitan COVID-19 dan nyahpepijat maklumat yang salah, dan ia memaparkan maklumat yang paling terkenal dari katalog diantara pengguna Twitter di kawasan geografik U.S. yang dipilih oleh pengguna. Kertas menjelaskan bagaimana menggunakan model BERT untuk sepadan tweet dengan fakta dan salah maklumat dan untuk mengesan kedudukan mereka terhadap maklumat seperti itu. Kertas juga membincangkan hasil percubaan awal mengenai menganalisis penyebaran ruang-temporal salah maklumat.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje aktualne kamienie milowe osiągnięte w naszym bieżącym projekcie, którego celem jest zrozumienie nadzoru, wpływu i interwencji na misinfodemię COVID-19 na Twitterze. W szczególności wprowadza publiczny pulpit nawigacyjny, który oprócz wyświetlania liczby przypadków na interaktywnej mapie i panelu nawigacyjnym, zapewnia również kilka unikalnych funkcji niespotykanych w innych miejscach. W szczególności pulpit korzysta z kuratorskiego katalogu faktów związanych z COVID-19 i obarczeń błędnych informacji, a także wyświetla najczęstsze informacje z katalogu wśród użytkowników Twittera w wybranych przez użytkownika regionach geograficznych USA. W artykule wyjaśniono, jak wykorzystać modele BERT do dopasowania tweetów do faktów i dezinformacji oraz wykrywania ich stanowiska wobec takich informacji. W artykule omówiono również wyniki wstępnych eksperymentów dotyczących analizy przestrzenno-czasowego rozprzestrzeniania się dezinformacji.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje trenutne preglede postignute u našem trenutnom projektu koji je cilj da shvati nadzor, utjecaj i intervenciju na COVID-19 pogrešnu nepodemiju na Twitter. Posebno, to predstavlja javnu tablu koja, dodatno broj slučajeva na interaktivnoj mapi i navigacijskom panelu, takođe pruža neke jedinstvene karakteristike koje nisu pronašli na drugim mjestima. Posebno, tašna ploča koristi korišteni katalog činjenica povezanih sa COVID-19 i debunks pogrešne informacije, i pokazuje najprevalentnije informacije iz kataloga među korisnicima Twitter-a u geografskim regijama američkih korisnika. U novinama objašnjava kako koristiti BERT modele kako bi odgovarali sa tweetom činjenicama i pogrešnom informacijom i otkrili svoj stav prema takvim informacijama. U novinama se takođe razgovara o rezultatima preliminarnih eksperimenata o analizi svemirskovremenog širenja pogrešne informacije.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie etapele actuale atinse în cadrul proiectului nostru în curs de desfășurare, care își propune să înțeleagă supravegherea, impactul și intervenția asupra dezinfodemiei COVID-19 pe Twitter. Mai exact, introduce un tablou de bord public care, pe lângă afișarea numărului de cazuri într-o hartă interactivă și un panou de navigație, oferă, de asemenea, unele caracteristici unice care nu se găsesc în alte locuri. În special, tabloul de bord utilizează un catalog curatoriat de fapte legate de COVID-19 și debankuri de dezinformare și afișează cele mai răspândite informații din catalog în rândul utilizatorilor Twitter din regiunile geografice ale SUA selectate de utilizatori. Lucrarea explică modul de utilizare a modelelor BERT pentru a corespunde tweeturilor cu faptele și dezinformațiile și pentru a detecta poziția lor față de astfel de informații. Lucrarea discută, de asemenea, rezultatele experimentelor preliminare privind analiza răspândirii spațio-temporale a dezinformării.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver dei gjeldande målene som er oppretta i vårt gjeldande prosjekt som må forstå overvåkinga, effekten av og intervensjon på COVID-19 misfodemisk på Twitter. Dette introduserer eit offentleg skrivebord som, i tillegg til å visa små bokstavar i eit interaktivt kart og eit navigasjonspanel, også gjev nokre unike funksjonar som ikkje finst i andre stader. Spesielt bruker kontrollpartet ein kursert katalogen av COVID-19-relaterte faktar og debunksjonar av feil-formatering, og det viser den mest utbreidde informasjonen frå katalogen blant Twitter-brukarar i amerikanske geografiske område. Papiret forklarer korleis BERT- modeller skal brukast for å passa med tweets med fakta og feil- informasjon og oppdaga stasjonen til slike informasjon. Papiret diskuterer også resultatet av første eksperimenter på å analysera mellomromtidig spreidde av feil-informasjon.', 'so': 'Warqaddan wuxuu ku qoraa dhagaxyada joogtada ah oo laga soo gaadhay qoraalkayaga socota, kaas oo ku talo gala inuu fahamo ilaalinta, saameyn ku yeelashada iyo qabsashada oo ku saabsan COVID-19 khaladaha ku saabsan Twitterka. Si gaar ah waxaa lagu soo bandhigaa miiska dadweynaha, kaas oo ka sokow muujinta tirada xaaladda oo ku qoran kartada interactive iyo panel baabuurta wadista, waxay sidoo kale ka heleysaa qeybo gaar ah oo a an meelo kale laga helin. Si gaar ah baaritaanku wuxuu isticmaalaa kataalog la xiriiray COVID-19 iyo cilmiga macluumaadka khaladda ah, wuxuuna ka muujiyaa macluumaadka ugu horeeya baaraahda isticmaalayaasha Twitter ee goobaha xuquuqda U.S. ka doortay. Warqaddu wuxuu ku qoran yahay sida loo isticmaali karo modelalka BERT si ay ugu soo bandhigaan labada tweetka, warqadda iyo warbixinta khaladda iyo si uu u caddeeyo xaaladooda xagga macluumaadkaas. Warqaddu wuxuu sidoo kale ka sheekaynayaa arimaha imtixaanka hore oo ku saabsan baaritaanka macluumaadka sharciga ku meelgaarka ah.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විස්තර කරනවා අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ව්\u200dයාපෘතියේ ලැබුණු ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තේරුම් ගන්න, ප්\u200dර විශේෂයෙන්, ඒක සාමාජික ඩැෂ්බෝර්ඩ් එකක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා, සම්බන්ධ සැත්තුවක් සහ පරීක්ෂණ පැනල් වලින්, අනි විශේෂයෙන්, ඩැෂ්බෝඩ් එක COVID-19 සම්බන්ධතාවක් සහ වැරැද්ධතාවක් සඳහා ක්\u200dරියාත්මක කැටාලෝග් භාවිතා කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ඒක පෙන්වන්නේ වැරැද්ධතා පත්තරය පැහැදිලි කරනවා BERT මොඩල් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න කොහොමද ට්විට් එක්ක ඇත්ත සහ වැරදිලි වැරදිලි සහ ඔවුන්ගේ ස්ථා මේ පත්තුව තමයි ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණාවගේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරීක්ෂණය විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver de aktuella milstolparna som uppnåtts i vårt pågående projekt som syftar till att förstå övervakning av, påverkan av och ingripande på COVID-19 misinfodemic på Twitter. Specifikt introduceras en offentlig instrumentpanel som, förutom att visa fallräkningar i en interaktiv karta och en navigeringspanel, även innehåller några unika funktioner som inte finns på andra platser. I synnerhet använder instrumentpanelen en kuraterad katalog med COVID-19 relaterade fakta och felsökningar av felaktig information, och den visar den vanligaste informationen från katalogen bland Twitter-användare i användarvalda geografiska områden i USA. Artikeln förklarar hur man använder BERT-modeller för att matcha tweets med fakta och felaktig information och för att upptäcka deras inställning till sådan information. Uppsatsen diskuterar även resultaten av preliminära experiment med att analysera den rums-tidsmässiga spridningen av vilsinformation.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தை குறிப்பிடுகிறது எங்கள் நடப்பு திட்டத்தில் நடப்பு மைல்கல்கள் அடைந்தது என்று குறிப்பிடுகிறது இது COVID-19 தொடர்பில் தவறான அண குறிப்பிட்டு, அது ஒரு பொது டாஷ்போர்டை குறிப்பிடுகிறது, அதை குறிப்பிடுகிறது, இடைவெளி வரைபடத்தில் உள்ள எண்ணிக்கைகளை மற்றும் நெடுவரிசைப் பல குறிப்பிட்டு, டாஷ்போர்டு COVID-19 தொடர்புடைய காரணிகள் மற்றும் தவறான தகவல் பிழைகளின் அட்டவணையை பயன்படுத்துகிறது, அது பயனர் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட அமெரிக்க புவியியல் இட இந்த காகிதத்தில் எப்படி BERT மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்துவது உண்மைகளையும் தவறான தகவலையும் பொருத்துவதற்காகவும் தெரியும் மற்றும்  இந்த காகிதத்தில் முன்னிருப்பு சோதனைகளின் முடிவுகளைப் பற்றி விவாதம் செய்கிறது தவறான தகவல்களை அறிவிக்கிறது.', 'ur': 'This paper describes the current milestones achieved in our ongoing project that aims to understand the surveillance of, impact of and intervention on COVID-19 misinfodemic on Twitter. ویسے طور پر، یہ ایک عمومی داشبورد کو معلوم کرتا ہے جس کے علاوہ ایک اپنا نقشه و نقشه میں کیس گنتی کو نمایش کرتا ہے اور ایک نقشه پانل بھی، اور دوسری جگہ میں کچھ مختلف فرصت پیدا نہیں کرتے۔ خصوصی طور پر، ڈاشابورد COVID-19 رابطہ دار حقیقت اور غلط طریقے کے ڈوبونک کا کاٹالوگ استعمال کرتا ہے، اور یہ ٹویٹر کارساز کے درمیان سے بہت زیادہ وسیع معلومات دکھاتا ہے، جو کارساز کے منتخب ہوئے ایالات متحدہ جغرافیک منطقه میں ہے. The paper explains how to use BERT models to match tweets with the facts and misinformation and to detect their position towards such information. یہ کاغذ اس سے بھی پہلی آزمائش کے نتیجے کی بحث کرتا ہے کہ اس کی غلط طریقے کے فضا اور مدت کے پھیلانے کی تحقیق کرے۔', 'uz': "Bu hujjat Twitterda COVID-19 noto'g'ri haqida qo'llanmalarni o'rganish, qo'shish va interventioni anglatadi. @ info Koʻrsatilgan dashboard, COVID-19 bogʻliq faktlar va xato maʼlumoti haqida xabar beruvchi katakdan foydalanadi va u Twitter foydalanuvchilaridan foydalanuvchi AQSH geographik sonlarida eng muhim maʼlumotni koʻrsatadi. Qogʻoz BERT modellari haqiqiqiy va xato maʼlumot bilan xabar qilish va bu maʼlumot uchun ularning holatini aniqlash mumkin. Qogʻoz xato maʼlumot tarkibini aniqlash uchun birinchi tajribalar natijasi haqida javob beradi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả những mốc quan trọng hiện nay được đạt đến trong dự án đang được tiến hành nhằm hiểu về sự giám sát, tác động của và can thiệp trên Twitter của COVID-19. Đặc biệt, nó giới thiệu một bảng đồng hồ công cộng, ngoài việc hiển thị các trường hợp trong một bản đồ tương tác và một bảng hiển thị, cũng cung cấp một số tính năng độc đáo không tìm thấy ở các nơi khác. Đặc biệt, bảng gạch dùng một danh mục phụ thuộc về COVID-19, cũng chỉ ra vài lỗi, và nó hiển thị những thông tin phổ biến nhất từ cuốn danh mục trên Twitter trong các người dùng tại các vùng địa lý Mỹ đã chọn. Bài báo giải thích cách sử dụng các mô hình BERT để kết nối tweet với thực tế và thông tin sai trái và phát hiện lập trường của họ về những thông tin này. Bài báo cũng thảo luận về kết quả thí nghiệm sơ bộ về phân tích sự lan rộng về khoảng thời gian của tin sai.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва текущите етапи, постигнати в текущия ни проект, който има за цел да разбере наблюдението, въздействието и намесата върху мизинфодемик в Туитър. По-конкретно, той въвежда публично табло, което освен да показва броя на случаите в интерактивна карта и навигационен панел, също така предоставя някои уникални функции, които не се намират на други места. По-специално, таблото използва подбран каталог с факти, свързани с Ковид-19 и дебанки на дезинформация, и показва най-разпространената информация от каталога сред потребителите в избраните от потребителя географски региони на САЩ. В статията се обяснява как да се използват моделите на BERT, за да се съчетаят туитовете с фактите и дезинформацията и да се установи тяхната позиция към такава информация. В статията се разглеждат и резултатите от предварителни експерименти за анализ на пространствено-времевото разпространение на дезинформацията.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje trenutne preglede postignute u našem trenutnom projektu koji se cilja razumjeti nadzor, utjecaja i intervencije na COVID-19 pogrešnu nedostatku na Twitteru. Posebno, predstavlja javnu ploču koja osim broja slučajeva na interaktivnoj mapi i navigacijskoj ploči također pruža neke jedinstvene karakteristike koje nisu pronašli na drugim mjestima. Posebno, daska ploča koristi korišteni katalog činjenica i debunka pogrešne informacije s COVID-19, i pokazuje najprevalentnije informacije iz kataloga među korisnicima Twitter-a u geografskim regijama američkih korisnika. U novinama objašnjava kako koristiti BERT modele kako bi odgovarali tweetovima činjenicama i pogrešnim informacijama i otkrili svoj stav prema takvim informacijama. U novinama se također razgovara o rezultatima preliminarnih eksperimenata o analiziranju svemirskovremenog širenja pogrešne informacije.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver de nuværende milepæle, der er opnået i vores igangværende projekt, der har til formål at forstå overvågningen af, effekten af og interventionen på COVID-19 misinfodemic på Twitter. Specielt introducerer den et offentligt dashboard, som ud over at vise case counts i et interaktivt kort og et navigationspanel også indeholder nogle unikke funktioner, der ikke findes andre steder. Især bruger dashboard et kurateret katalog med COVID-19 relaterede fakta og fejlfindinger af misinformation, og det viser de mest udbredte oplysninger fra kataloget blandt Twitter-brugere i brugervalgte amerikanske geografiske områder. Artiklen forklarer, hvordan man bruger BERT-modeller til at matche tweets med fakta og misinformation og til at afsløre deres holdning til sådanne oplysninger. Artiklen diskuterer også resultaterne af foreløbige eksperimenter med analyse af den rumtidsmæssige spredning af misinformation.', 'nl': "Dit document beschrijft de huidige mijlpalen bereikt in ons lopende project dat tot doel heeft de surveillance van, impact van en interventie op COVID-19 misinfodemic op Twitter te begrijpen. Met name introduceert het een openbaar dashboard dat, naast het weergeven van case-tellingen in een interactieve kaart en een navigatiepaneel, ook enkele unieke functies biedt die niet op andere plaatsen te vinden zijn. In het bijzonder maakt het dashboard gebruik van een samengestelde catalogus met COVID-19 gerelateerde feiten en onjuiste informatie, en het toont de meest voorkomende informatie uit de catalogus onder Twitter-gebruikers in door de gebruiker geselecteerde geografische regio's van de VS. Het artikel legt uit hoe BERT-modellen gebruikt kunnen worden om tweets te matchen met de feiten en verkeerde informatie en om hun standpunt ten opzichte van dergelijke informatie te detecteren. Het artikel bespreekt ook de resultaten van voorlopige experimenten over het analyseren van de ruimte-temporele verspreiding van misinformatie.", 'ko': '본고는 트위터에서 코로나에 대한 모니터링, 영향, 관여를 파악하기 위해 우리가 진행 중인 프로젝트가 현재 거둔 이정표를 기술한다.구체적으로 말하자면, 이것은 공공 계기판을 도입하여 상호작용식 지도와 네비게이션 패널에 병례 계수를 표시하는 것 외에 다른 곳에서 찾을 수 없는 독특한 기능을 제공했다.특히 계기판은 공들여 기획한 코로나 관련 사실 목록을 사용해 오류 정보를 들추어냈으며, 사용자가 선택한 미국 지리적 영역의 트위터 이용자 중 가장 흔한 목록 정보도 보여준다.본고는 버트 모델을 어떻게 사용하여 추문과 사실과 잘못된 정보를 일치시키고 이런 정보에 대한 그들의 태도를 측정하는지 설명한다.본고는 잘못된 정보의 시공 전파를 분석하는 초보적인 실험 결과도 논의했다.', 'de': 'Dieses Papier beschreibt die aktuellen Meilensteine, die in unserem laufenden Projekt erreicht wurden, das darauf abzielt, die Überwachung, Auswirkungen und Interventionen von COVID-19 Misinfodemic auf Twitter zu verstehen. Konkret wird ein öffentliches Dashboard eingeführt, das neben der Anzeige der Fallzahlen in einer interaktiven Karte und einem Navigationspanel auch einige einzigartige Funktionen bietet, die an anderen Orten nicht zu finden sind. Insbesondere verwendet das Dashboard einen kuratierten Katalog von COVID-19-bezogenen Fakten und Enthüllungen von Fehlinformationen und zeigt die häufigsten Informationen aus dem Katalog unter Twitter-Nutzern in vom Benutzer ausgewählten geografischen Regionen der USA an. Der Beitrag erläutert, wie BERT-Modelle genutzt werden können, um Tweets mit Fakten und Fehlinformationen abzugleichen und deren Haltung gegenüber solchen Informationen zu erkennen. Der Beitrag diskutiert auch die Ergebnisse von Vorversuchen zur Analyse der räumlich-zeitlichen Ausbreitung von Fehlinformationen.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ تعریف میل\u200cهای فعلی که در پروژه\u200cی ما در حال حاضر رسیده\u200cاند را توصیف می\u200cکند که هدف دارد نظارت، تأثیر و تأثیر\u200cهای فعلی COVID-19 در توئیتر را درک کند. مخصوصاً این تخته دستگاه عمومی را معرفی می\u200cکند که در addition to displaying case counts in an interactive map and a navigational panel also provides some unique features not found in other places. مخصوصاً تخته\u200cبندی از کاتالوگ متصل شده\u200cای از حقیقت\u200cهای COVID-19 رابطه\u200cی اشتباه\u200cسازی استفاده می\u200cکند و بهترین اطلاعات از کاتالوگ بین کاربران توئیتر در منطقه\u200cهای جغرافی متحده آمریکا را نمایش می\u200cدهد. این کاغذ توضیح می\u200cدهد که چگونه از مدل BERT استفاده کنند تا با توئیت با حقیقت و غلط توضیح کنند و وضعیت آنها را به این اطلاعات شناسایی کنند. این کاغذ همچنین نتیجه آزمایش پیشینیان را در مورد تحلیل گسترش فضایی و موقتی اشتباهی تغییر داده است.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan milestones saat ini yang dicapai dalam proyek kami yang sedang berlangsung yang bertujuan untuk memahami pengawasan, dampak dan intervensi pada COVID-19 misinfodemik di Twitter. Secara spesifik, ia memperkenalkan dashboard publik yang, selain menampilkan jumlah kasus dalam peta interaktif dan panel navigasi, juga menyediakan beberapa fitur unik yang tidak ditemukan di tempat lain. Terutama, papan daftar menggunakan katalog yang dikurasi dari fakta-fakta terkait COVID-19 dan penyelesaian informasi yang salah, dan menunjukkan informasi yang paling prevalent dari katalog diantara pengguna Twitter di wilayah geografi AS yang dipilih oleh pengguna. Kertas menjelaskan bagaimana menggunakan model BERT untuk cocok tweet dengan fakta dan informasi salah dan untuk mendeteksi posisi mereka terhadap informasi seperti itu. Kertas juga mendiskusikan hasil percobaan awal tentang menganalisis penyebaran ruang-waktu salah informasi.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die huidige milestone wat in ons voortgaande projek bereik is wat doel om die onderhouering van, invloek van en intervening op COVID-19 misfodemie op Twitter te verstaan. Spesifieke, dit introduseer 'n publieke dashboard wat, in addition to displaying case counts in an interactive map and a navigational panel, also provides some unique features not found in other places. Spesiaal, die dashboard gebruik 'n uitgeleide katalog van COVID-19 verwante fakte en debunks van verkeerde formasie, en dit vertoon die mees uitbreidingste inligting van die katalog onder Twitter gebruikers in gebruiker-gekose U.S. geografiese regione. Die papier verduidelik hoe om BERT models te gebruik om tweets te ooreenstem met die fakte en verkeerde formasie en om hul staanse teen sodanige inligting te ontdek. Die papier bespreek ook die resultate van vooraf eksperimente om die spasie-tydelike versprei van verkeerde formasie te analyseer.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyz biziň şu wagt geçjek taslaýamyzda ýetip bolan sowgatlary, COVID-19 ýalňyşlyk hasaplamagymyzda düşünjegimizi düşünýär. Aýratyn faýla, ol halk taýşartçiligi görkezýär. Bir etkileşimli mapadada kiçi/beýik harplary görkezýän taýşartçiligi daşartýar. Başga ýerlerde tapylmadyk käbir beýik harplary täsir edýär. Aýratyn bolsa, dashboard COVID-19 barada ýalňyş şekilde meňzeş bolan faktalaryň we günäsiz şekilde meňzeş bolan katalogyny ulanýar we bu ýerde Twitter qullanıcılaryň arasyndaky iň golaýat maglumaty görkez. Gazet BERT nusgalaryny bu şekilde tweets bilen nähili ulanmalydygyny we olaryň durumyny şol malümat bilen tanyşdyrmak üçin düşünýär. Bu kagyz hem uzakda-wagt ýalňyş şekliniň ýalňyşynyň netijelerini çykýar.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mawe ya sasa yaliyofanikiwa katika mradi wetu unaoendelea na lengo la kuelewa ufuatiliaji wa, madhara na kuingilia kati kwenye mtandao wa Twita wa COVID-19. Kwa hakika, inaonyesha kituo cha umma ambacho, pamoja na kuonyesha idadi ya kesi katika ramani ya kati na kituo cha usafiri, pia hutoa vipengele vya kipekee ambavyo havijapatikana katika maeneo mengine. Tafsiri, maduka hayo inatumia orodha ya ukweli unaohusika na COVID-19 na maeneo ya taarifa zisizo sahihi, na inaonyesha taarifa za kawaida zaidi kutoka kwenye orodha ya watumiaji wa Twita katika maeneo ya geographia yanayochaguliwa nchini Marekani. Gazeti hilo linaeleza namna ya kutumia mifano ya BERT kupigania twiti na ukweli na taarifa zisizo sahihi na kutambua msimamo wao kwa taarifa hizi. Gazeti hilo pia linajadili matokeo ya majaribio ya awali kuhusu kuchambua taarifa zisizo sahihi.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan etapat e tanishme të arritura në projektin tonë në vazhdim që synon të kuptojë mbikqyrjen e, ndikimin e dhe ndërhyrjen në COVID-19 në Twitter. Veçan ërisht, ajo fut një tabelë të dashboard publike që, përveç shfaqjes së numrave të rasteve në një hartë interaktive dhe një panel navigacioni, ofron gjithashtu disa karakteristika unike që nuk janë gjetur në vende të tjera. Veçanërisht, bordi përdor një katalog të kuruar të fakteve të lidhura me COVID-19 dhe zhdukjeve të gabuara të informacionit dhe shfaq informacionin më të përhapur nga katalogu midis përdoruesve të Twitter-it në rajonet gjeografikë të zgjedhur nga përdoruesit e SHBA. Gazeta shpjegon se si të përdorin modelet BERT për të përputhur tweetet me faktet dhe informacionet e gabuara dhe për të zbuluar qëndrimin e tyre drejt informacionit të tillë. Gazeta diskuton gjithashtu rezultatet e eksperimenteve paraprake mbi analizën e shpërndarjes hapësire-kohore të keqinformacionit.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր ընթացիկ նախագծի ներկայիս քայլերը, որոնք նպատակով են հասկանալ COVID-19 սխալ տեղեկատվության հետևման, ազդեցության և ներխուժման մասին Թվիթերի վրա: Հատկապես, այն ներկայացնում է հանրային աղյուսակի, որը, բացի ինտերակտիվ քարտեզի և նավիրացիոն աղյուսակի դեպքերի հաշվարկների ցուցադրումից, նաև որոշ առանձնահատկություններ է ներկայացնում, որոնք չգտնվում են այլ տեղերում: Հատկապես, աղյուսակը օգտագործում է COVID-19-ի կառավարված կատալոգ սխալ տեղեկատվության փաստերի և բացահայտումների, և այն ցույց է տալիս ամենահաճախ տեղեկատվությունը Թվիթերի օգտագործողների կատալոգից օգտագործողների միջև օգտագործողների ընտրված ԱՄՆ երկրագրական հատվածներում: Թղթի մեջ բացատրվում է, թե ինչպես օգտագործել BER մոդելները, որպեսզի համեմատենք թվիթերը փաստերի և սխալ տեղեկատվության հետ, և հայտնաբերենք նրանց դիրքը այդ տեղեկատվության նկատմամբ: Այս թղթին նաև քննարկում է սխալ տեղեկատվության տարածման տարածության վերլուծության նախաձեռնական փորձարկումների արդյունքները:', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም በተቃውሞው ፕሮጀክታችን የቆይቶ፣ የCOVID-19 የክፋት ውይይት እና መግለጫ ለመግለጽ የሚቻለውን የአሁኑን ሚሊዮችን ይናገራል፡፡ በተለየ ጊዜ የህዝብ ሰርቨርስቲ ማሳየት በተጨማሪው ማረፊያ እና በመቀናቀል panel ውስጥ ቁጥር በተጨማሪም፣ በሌላ ስፍራ ያልተገኘውን የተለየ ምርጫዎች ያስቀምጣል፡፡ በተለይም የሳንሱር ሳንሱር በተመረጠው የአሜሪካ geographic ክልሎች በተጠቃሚ ትዊተር ተጠቃሚዎች መካከል የተለየ የኮቪዲ-19 ተሟጋቾች እና የስሕተት መረጃዎችን የሚጠቅመውን የክፍለ መረጃን ይታያል፡፡ የፕሬግራሙ ወሬት እውነቱን እና የስሕተት መረጃዎችን ለመጠቀም የBERT ሞዴላዎችን እንዴት ለመጠቀም እና እንደዚህ መረጃዎች ስሜታቸውን ለማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ የፕሬዝዳንቱ ደግሞ የፊተኛውን ፈተና የስሕተት ዘመቻ የስሕተት መረጃዎችን በማስተዋል ውጤቶች ላይ ያዋርዳል፡፡', 'az': "Bu kağıt bizim sürəkli proyektimizdə başa çatdığımız günümüzdeki məsafələri təsbit edir ki, Twitter'da COVID-19 yanlış təsirlərinin gözləməsini, təsirlərini və intervencisini anlamaq niyyətindədir. Özellikle, bu halkı dashboard təşkil edir ki, interaktif xəritə və navigasyon panelini göstərmək üçün, başqa yerlərdə tapılmadığı bəzi ünsiyyətlər də təşkil edir. Özellikle, dashboard COVID-19 ilə bağlı faktların və yanlış informasiyaların kökülük katalogu istifadə edir, və bu, U.S. ģeogrāfiski bölgelerində Twitter istifadəçilərinin ən geniş məlumatını göstərir. Kağıt BERT modellərini həqiqətlərlə, yanlış informasiyayla tweets ilə necə istifadə edəcəyini və onların durumunu belə informasiyaya təsdiqləməsini təsdiqləyir. Bu kağıt həmçinin yanlış informasyonun uzaq-temporal yayılması haqqında ilk təcrübələrin sonuçlarını analizə edir.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা আমাদের চলমান প্রকল্পে বর্তমান মাইল পাথরের বর্ণনা করেছে যার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে টুইটারে কভিড-১৯ ভুল নির্যাতনের উপর নজর র রাখা, প্রভাব ও হ বিশেষ করে এটি একটি পাবলিক ড্যাশ বোর্ড পরিচয় করিয়ে দেয় যেখানে কেসের সংখ্যা একটি ইন্টারনেটিভ মানচিত্র এবং একটি ন্যাভিগেশনাল প্যানেলে প্রদর্শন করা ছাড় বিশেষ করে, ড্যাশবোর্ড কভিড-১৯ সংক্রান্ত তথ্য এবং ভুল তথ্যের বিষয়টি ব্যবহার করে একটি কাঠালা ব্যবহার করে এবং এটি টুইটার ব্যবহারকারীদের মধ্যে টুইটার ব্যবহারকারীদের মধ্ এই পত্রিকা ব্যাখ্যা করেছে কিভাবে বেরেটি মডেল ব্যবহার করা যায় সত্য এবং ভুল তথ্যের সাথে টুইটের মিলে যাওয়া এবং এই তথ্যের প্রত এই প্রথম পরীক্ষার ফলাফল নিয়ে আলোচনা করেছে যে ভুল তথ্য বিশ্লেষণ করা হয়েছে।', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje trenutne preglede postignute u našem trenutnom projektu koji se cilja razumjeti nadzor, utjecaja i intervencije na COVID-19 pogrešnu nepodemiju na Twitter. Posebno, on predstavlja javnu ploču koja osim broja slučajeva na interaktivnoj mapi i navigacijskoj ploči također pruža neke jedinstvene karakteristike koje nisu pronašli na drugim mjestima. Posebno, daska ploča koristi korišteni katalog činjenica i debunka pogrešne informacije vezanih za COVID-19, i pokazuje najprevalentnije informacije iz kataloga među korisnicima Twitter-a u geografskim regijama američkih korisnika. U novinama objašnjava kako koristiti BERT modele kako bi odgovarali sa tweetom činjenicama i pogrešnom informacijom i otkrili svoj stav prema takvim informacijama. U novinama se također razgovara o rezultatima preliminarnih eksperimenata o analizi svemirskovremenog širenja pogrešne informacije.', 'ca': "Aquest paper descriu les etapes milers actuals aconseguides en el nostre projecte en curs que busca entendre la supervisió, l'impacte de la COVID-19 i l'intervenció en Twitter. Concretament, introdueix un quadre de control públic que, a més de mostrar el nombre de casos en un mapa interactiu i un panel de navegació, també proporciona algunes característiques únices que no es troben en altres llocs. Particularly, the dashboard uses a curated catalog of COVID-19 related facts and debunks of misinformation, and it displays the most prevalent information from the catalog among Twitter users in user-selected U.S. geographic regions.  El paper explica com utilitzar els models BERT per ajustar els tweets amb els fets i la mala informació i detectar la seva posició cap a aquesta informació. El paper també discute els resultats d'experiments preliminars sobre l'anàlisi de l'espai-temporal diferència de la mala informació.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje současné milníky dosažené v našem probíhajícím projektu, jehož cílem je porozumět sledování, dopadu a intervenci na COVID-19 misinfodemic na Twitteru. Konkrétně představuje veřejný panel, který kromě zobrazení počtu případů v interaktivní mapě a navigačním panelu poskytuje také některé unikátní funkce, které se na jiných místech nenacházejí. Přístrojový panel používá zejména kurátorovaný katalog faktů souvisejících s COVID-19 a odstranění dezinformací a zobrazuje nejrozšířenější informace z katalogu mezi uživateli Twitteru v uživateli vybraných zeměpisných oblastech USA. Článek vysvětluje, jak použít BERT modely k porovnání tweetů s fakty a dezinformací a k odhalení jejich postoje k těmto informacím. Příspěvek také diskutuje výsledky předběžných experimentů na analýzu prostorově-časového šíření dezinformace.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldatakse praegusi vahe-eesmärke, mis on saavutatud meie käimasolevas projektis, mille eesmärk on mõista COVID-19 misinfodeemic seiret, mõju ja sekkumist Twitteris. Täpsemalt tutvustab see avalikku armatuurlauda, mis lisaks juhtumite arvu kuvamisele interaktiivsel kaardil ja navigatsioonipaneelil pakub ka mõningaid unikaalseid funktsioone, mida mujalt ei leita. Eelkõige kasutab armatuurlaud COVID-19-ga seotud faktide ja valeteabe tühjenduste kureeritud kataloogi ning kuvab kataloogi kõige levinumat teavet Twitteri kasutajate seas USA geograafilistes piirkondades. Artiklis selgitatakse, kuidas kasutada BERTi mudeleid, et sobitada säutsud faktide ja valeteabega ning tuvastada nende seisukoht sellise teabe suhtes. Töös käsitletakse ka valeinformatsiooni ruumi-ajalise leviku analüüsimise esialgsete eksperimentide tulemusi.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan meneillään olevassa projektissamme saavutettuja virstanpylväitä, joiden tavoitteena on ymmärtää COVID-19 misinfodemicin seurantaa, vaikutusta ja puuttumista Twitterissä. Erityisesti siinä esitellään julkinen hallintapaneeli, joka sen lisäksi, että tapausmäärät näytetään interaktiivisessa kartassa ja navigointipaneelissa, tarjoaa myös joitakin ainutlaatuisia ominaisuuksia, joita ei löydy muista paikoista. Erityisesti hallintapaneeli käyttää valikoitua luetteloa COVID-19:een liittyvistä tosiasioista ja väärien tietojen virheistä, ja se näyttää luettelon yleisimmät tiedot käyttäjien valitsemilla Yhdysvaltain maantieteellisillä alueilla Twitter-käyttäjien keskuudessa. Artikkelissa selitetään, miten BERT-mallien avulla tweetit voidaan yhdistää faktoihin ja vääriin tietoihin ja havaita niiden suhtautuminen tällaisiin tietoihin. Työssä käsitellään myös väärinformaation tila-ajallisen leviämisen analysointia koskevien alustavien kokeiden tuloksia.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki rambarang pancen tanggal nggawé éntuk ning acara dadi iki dadi, nik awak dhéwé ngerasah nyohani, nggunakake lan entèwonan kanggo ngerasakno CVD-19 misara dipun. dialog Ngerti tambah, dadi panceng usukake karbot kanggo resmi dianggawe barang coret-19 karo debunk nggawe informasi sing dibenalke kanggo saka Catahan sing ngenggo gambar pengguna-pengguna Tutuk isi diputara bener U.S. jeografi Laptop" and "Desktop Laptop" and "Desktop', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje trenutne mejnike, dosežene v našem tekočem projektu, katerega cilj je razumeti nadzor nad misinfodemikom COVID-19, njegov učinek in posredovanje na Twitterju. Natančneje uvaja javno nadzorno ploščo, ki poleg prikaza števila primerov na interaktivnem zemljevidu in navigacijski plošči ponuja tudi nekatere edinstvene funkcije, ki jih ni mogoče najti na drugih mestih. Predvsem nadzorna plošča uporablja urejen katalog dejstev, povezanih s COVID-19, in razkrivanja napačnih informacij ter prikazuje najbolj razširjene informacije iz kataloga med uporabniki Twitterja v geografskih regijah ZDA, ki jih je izbral uporabnik. V prispevku je pojasnjeno, kako uporabiti modele BERT za usklajevanje tweetov z dejstvi in napačnimi informacijami ter zaznavanje njihovega stališča do takih informacij. Prispevek obravnava tudi rezultate predhodnih poskusov analize prostorsko-časovnega širjenja napačnih informacij.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את האמצעים הנוכחים שנוצאים בפרויקט הממשיך שלנו שמטרה להבין את מעקב, השפעה של והתערבות על COVID-19 שגוי-אינפודמיה בטוויטר. במיוחד, הוא מציג לוח דחף ציבורי אשר, בנוסף להצגת ספירת מקרים במפה אינטראקטיבית ופאנל ניווט, גם מספק כמה תכונות ייחודיות שלא נמצאות במקומות אחרים. במיוחד, הלוח השתמש בקטלוג מושלם של עובדות וקשורות COVID-19 של מידע לא נכון, והוא מציג את המידע הכי פולט בקטלוג בין משתמשים בטוויטר באזורים גאוגרפיים של ארצות הברית. העיתון מסביר איך להשתמש בדוגמנים BERT כדי להתאים טוויטים עם העובדות והמידע הלא נכון ולגלות את עמדתם כלפי מידע כזה. The paper also discusses the results of preliminary experiments on analyzing the spatio-temporal spread of misinformation.', 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ད་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་བཞིན་པའི་མ་འོངས ཁྱད་པར་ནི། འདིས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་ཞིག་སྟོན་པ་དེ་ལ་དབུས་འབྱུང་བའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་དང་ཕྱོགས Particularly, the dashboard uses a curated catalog of COVID-19 related facts and debunks of misinformation, and it displays the most prevalent information from the catalog among Twitter users in the user-selected U.S. geographic regions. ཤོག ཤོག་བྱང་དེས་ཀྱིས་བར་སྟོང་གནས་ཚུལ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་པའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་ཚོའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་ཀ་དེ་ཡང་བཤད་ཀྱང་།', 'ha': 'Wannan takardan na bayyana kilometers da ke kai yanzu a cikin mazaɓa da ke iya iya amfani da wajen fahimtar tsarin, mai shagala da kuma an haɗa a kan COV-19. Yana ƙunsa da wani shirin bayani na umma, wanda, a bayan nuna ƙidãyar sakan cikin wani karta mai tsakiya da fanel na tafiyar hanya, yana ƙunsa da wasu masu buƙata ba da a cikin wasu wurãre. Taƙa it a, shirin dashboard yana amfani da wani katafaka na masu husũma na COV-19 da aka nuna misinformation, kuma yana nuna mafi zaman agare daga fanel daga fanel na Twitter cikin regions da aka zãɓe U.S. geographic. Gauranin na bayyana yadda a yi amfani da misãlai BERT zuwa masu daidaita na Twitter da gaskiyar da information na ƙarya, kuma ya gane stance su zuwa wannan maɓalli. Kayan takarda yana kula da matsala na jarrabar farko a kan analyza the spayon-temporary-sharing of misinformation.'}
{'en': 'A description and demonstration of SAFAR framework', 'ar': 'وصف ومظاهرة إطار SAFAR', 'fr': 'Description et démonstration du framework SAFAR', 'es': 'Descripción y demostración del marco SAFAR', 'pt': 'Uma descrição e demonstração da estrutura SAFAR', 'ja': 'Safarフレームワークの説明とデモンストレーション', 'zh': 'SAFAR框架述演之', 'hi': 'SAFAR ढांचे का विवरण और प्रदर्शन', 'ru': 'Описание и демонстрация фреймворка SAFAR', 'ga': 'Cur síos agus léiriú ar chreat SAFAR....', 'el': 'Περιγραφή και επίδειξη του πλαισίου SAFAR', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'A SAFAR keretrendszer leírása és bemutatása', 'lt': 'A description and demonstration of SAFAR framework', 'kk': 'SAFAR фреймінің сипаттамасы мен көрсетуName', 'mk': 'A description and demonstration of SAFAR framework', 'ms': 'A description and demonstration of SAFAR framework', 'it': 'Descrizione e dimostrazione del quadro SAFAR', 'mt': 'Deskrizzjoni u dimostrazzjoni tal-qafas SAFAR', 'ml': 'SAFAR ഫ്രെയിമെയിന്\u200dറെ വിശദീകരണവും പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുക', 'no': 'Name', 'mn': 'SAFAR хэлбэрийн тодорхойлолт', 'pl': 'Opis i demonstracja ram SAFAR', 'ro': 'Descrierea și demonstrarea cadrului SAFAR', 'so': 'Tilmaan iyo muujinta framework SAFAR', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'En beskrivning och demonstration av SAFAR-ramen', 'ta': 'A description and demonstration of SAFAR framework', 'sr': 'Opis i demonstracija SAFAR okvira', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mô tả và biểu lộ về bộ khung SAFARC', 'bg': 'Описание и демонстрация на рамката на SAFAR', 'nl': 'Een beschrijving en demonstratie van het SAFAR-kader', 'hr': 'Opis i demonstracija SAFAR okvira', 'da': 'En beskrivelse og demonstration af SAFAR-rammerne', 'de': 'Beschreibung und Demonstration des SAFAR-Rahmens', 'id': 'Deskripsi dan demonstrasi cadangan SAFAR', 'fa': 'توضیح و نمایش چهارچوب SAFAR', 'af': 'Name', 'ko': 'SAFAR 프레임워크에 대한 설명 및 프레젠테이션', 'sw': 'Maelezo na maandamano ya mfumo wa SAFAR', 'am': 'የSAFAR ፍሬም መግለጫ እና ማሳየት', 'tr': "SAFAR fraým'yň waspy we görkezilişi", 'hy': 'Սաֆար համակարգի նկարագրությունը և ցուցադրությունը', 'bn': 'SAFAR ফ্রেমের একটি বর্ণনা এবং প্রদর্শন', 'sq': 'Një përshkrim dhe demonstrim i kuadrit SAFAR', 'bs': 'Opis i demonstracija SAFAR okvira', 'cs': 'Popis a ukázka rámce SAFAR', 'az': 'SAFAR 칞er칞ivesinin t톛fsil v톛 g칬st톛ricisi', 'et': 'SAFARi raamistiku kirjeldus ja tõendamine', 'fi': 'SAFAR-järjestelmän kuvaus ja esittely', 'ca': 'Una descripció i demostració del marc SAFAR', 'ha': 'Bayani da nuna kan firam na SAFR', 'sk': 'Opis in prikaz okvira SAFAR', 'he': 'תיאור והדגמה של סגרת SAFAR', 'bo': 'A description and demonstration of SAFAR framework', 'jv': 'Sampuran karo pembantune soko sapar éntuk'}
{'en': 'Several tools and resources have been developed to deal with Arabic NLP. However, a homogenous and flexible Arabic environment that gathers these components is rarely available. In this perspective, we introduce SAFAR which is a monolingual framework developed in accordance with software engineering requirements and dedicated to Arabic language, especially, the modern standard Arabic and Moroccan dialect. After one decade of integration and development, SAFAR possesses today more than 50 tools and resources that can be exploited either using its API or using its web interface.', 'ar': 'تم تطوير العديد من الأدوات والموارد للتعامل مع معالجة اللغات الطبيعية العربية. ومع ذلك ، نادرًا ما تتوفر بيئة عربية متجانسة ومرنة تجمع هذه المكونات. من هذا المنظور ، نقدم SAFAR وهو إطار أحادي اللغة تم تطويره وفقًا لمتطلبات هندسة البرمجيات ومخصص للغة العربية ، وخاصة اللغة العربية القياسية الحديثة واللهجة المغربية. بعد عقد من التكامل والتطوير ، تمتلك SAFAR اليوم أكثر من 50 أداة وموارد يمكن استغلالها إما باستخدام واجهة برمجة التطبيقات الخاصة بها أو باستخدام واجهة الويب الخاصة بها.', 'pt': 'Diversas ferramentas e recursos foram desenvolvidos para lidar com a PNL árabe. No entanto, um ambiente árabe homogêneo e flexível que reúne esses componentes raramente está disponível. Nesta perspectiva, apresentamos o SAFAR que é um framework monolíngue desenvolvido de acordo com os requisitos de engenharia de software e dedicado à língua árabe, especialmente, o moderno padrão árabe e dialeto marroquino. Após uma década de integração e desenvolvimento, o SAFAR possui hoje mais de 50 ferramentas e recursos que podem ser explorados tanto por sua API quanto por sua interface web.', 'es': 'Se han desarrollado varias herramientas y recursos para tratar la PNL árabe. Sin embargo, rara vez se dispone de un entorno árabe homogéneo y flexible que reúna estos componentes. En esta perspectiva, presentamos SAFAR, que es un marco monolingüe desarrollado de acuerdo con los requisitos de ingeniería de software y dedicado al idioma árabe, especialmente, el dialecto árabe y marroquí estándar moderno. Tras una década de integración y desarrollo, SAFAR cuenta hoy en día con más de 50 herramientas y recursos que pueden explotarse mediante su API o su interfaz web.', 'fr': "Plusieurs outils et ressources ont été développés pour traiter la PNL arabe. Cependant, un environnement arabe homogène et flexible regroupant ces composants est rarement disponible. Dans cette perspective, nous présentons SAFAR qui est un framework monolingue développé conformément aux exigences du génie logiciel et dédié à la langue arabe, en particulier l'arabe standard moderne et le dialecte marocain. Après une décennie d'intégration et de développement, SAFAR possède aujourd'hui plus de 50 outils et ressources qui peuvent être exploités à l'aide de son API ou de son interface Web.", 'ja': 'アラビア語NLPに対処するために、いくつかのツールとリソースが開発されています。しかしながら、これらの構成要素を集めた均質で柔軟なアラビア語環境はほとんど利用できない。この観点から、ソフトウェア工学の要件に従って開発され、アラビア語、特に現代標準アラビア語とモロッコ語の方言に特化したモノリンガルフレームワークであるSafarを紹介します。10年間の統合と開発の後、Safarは現在、そのAPIまたはWebインターフェースを使用して利用できる50以上のツールとリソースを所有しています。', 'zh': '已发数器及资源以处阿拉伯语NLP。 然收其组件同质灵阿拉伯语境罕可用。 以此观之,介于SAFAR,软件工程之单语框架也,专对阿拉伯语,特今代阿拉伯语摩洛哥言也。 十年之集,SAFAR今有50器用,可用其APIWeb界面。', 'hi': 'अरबी एनएलपी से निपटने के लिए कई उपकरण और संसाधन विकसित किए गए हैं। हालांकि, एक समरूप और लचीला अरबी वातावरण जो इन घटकों को इकट्ठा करता है, शायद ही कभी उपलब्ध होता है। इस परिप्रेक्ष्य में, हम SAFAR पेश करते हैं जो सॉफ्टवेयर इंजीनियरिंग आवश्यकताओं के अनुसार विकसित एक मोनोलिंगुअल फ्रेमवर्क है और अरबी भाषा के लिए समर्पित है, विशेष रूप से, आधुनिक मानक अरबी और मोरक्को बोली। एकीकरण और विकास के एक दशक के बाद, SAFAR के पास आज 50 से अधिक उपकरण और संसाधन हैं जिनका या तो अपने एपीआई का उपयोग करके या इसके वेब इंटरफ़ेस का उपयोग करके शोषण किया जा सकता है।', 'ru': 'Был разработан ряд инструментов и ресурсов для решения вопросов, связанных с НЛП на арабском языке. Однако однородная и гибкая арабская среда, объединяющая эти компоненты, доступна редко. В этой перспективе мы представляем SAFAR, который представляет собой одноязычную структуру, разработанную в соответствии с требованиями к разработке программного обеспечения и посвященную арабскому языку, особенно современному стандартному арабскому и марокканскому диалекту. После десяти лет интеграции и разработки, SAFAR сегодня обладает более чем 50 инструментами и ресурсами, которые можно использовать как с помощью API, так и с помощью веб-интерфейса.', 'ga': 'Forbraíodh go leor uirlisí agus acmhainní chun déileáil le NLP Araibis. Mar sin féin, is annamh a bhíonn timpeallacht Arabach aonchineálach agus solúbtha a bhailíonn na comhpháirteanna seo ar fáil. Sa pheirspictíocht seo, tugaimid isteach SAFAR ar creat aonteangach é a forbraíodh de réir riachtanais innealtóireachta bogearraí agus atá tiomanta do theanga Araibis, go háirithe, an chanúint chaighdeánach Araibis agus Mharacó nua-aimseartha. Tar éis deich mbliana de chomhtháthú agus de fhorbairt, tá níos mó ná 50 uirlis agus acmhainní ag SAFAR inniu is féidir a shaothrú trí úsáid a bhaint as a API nó ag baint úsáide as a chomhéadan gréasáin.', 'ka': 'რამდენიმე ხელსაწყობილობი და რესურსი განვითარებულია აპაბიური NLP-ზე. მაგრამ, ჰომოგენო და გრძნობელი აპაბიური გარეშე, რომელიც ამ კომპონენტების გარეშე შეიძლება არაფერად გარეშე. ამ პერსპექტიკში ჩვენ SAFAR-ს ჩვენებთ, რომელიც არის მონოლენგური ფრამეტრი, რომელიც პროგრამეტური ინექნიერების შესაძლებლობით განვითარებული და აპაბური ენაზე განსაზღვრული, განსაზღვრ ერთი წლის შემდეგ ინტერგურაცია და განვითარება SAFAR დღეს უფრო მეტი 50 ხელსაწყობილობი და რესურსები აქვს, რომლებიც შეიძლება გამოყენება API-ის გამოყენება ან საბოლო', 'hu': 'Számos eszközt és erőforrást fejlesztettek ki az arab NLP kezelésére. Azonban ritkán áll rendelkezésre homogén és rugalmas arab környezet, amely összegyűjti ezeket az összetevőket. Ebből a szempontból bemutatjuk a SAFAR-t, amely egy olyan egynyelvű keretrendszer, amelyet a szoftverfejlesztési követelményeknek megfelelően fejlesztettek ki, és amely az arab nyelvnek, különösen a modern szabványos arab és marokkói dialektusnak szenteltek. Egy évtizedes integráció és fejlesztés után a SAFAR ma már több mint 50 eszközzel és erőforrással rendelkezik, amelyek akár API-jával, akár webes felületével kiaknázhatók.', 'it': 'Diversi strumenti e risorse sono stati sviluppati per affrontare il PNL arabo. Tuttavia, un ambiente arabo omogeneo e flessibile che raccoglie questi componenti è raramente disponibile. In questa prospettiva, presentiamo SAFAR che è un framework monolingue sviluppato secondo i requisiti di ingegneria software e dedicato alla lingua araba, in particolare, il moderno standard arabo e dialetto marocchino. Dopo un decennio di integrazione e sviluppo, SAFAR possiede oggi più di 50 strumenti e risorse che possono essere sfruttate sia utilizzando la sua API che utilizzando la sua interfaccia web.', 'el': 'Έχουν αναπτυχθεί αρκετά εργαλεία και πόροι για την αντιμετώπιση της αραβικής ΝΛΠ. Ωστόσο, ένα ομοιογενές και ευέλικτο αραβικό περιβάλλον που συγκεντρώνει αυτά τα συστατικά είναι σπάνια διαθέσιμο. Σε αυτή την προοπτική, εισάγουμε το SAFAR το οποίο είναι ένα μονογλωσσικό πλαίσιο που αναπτύχθηκε σύμφωνα με τις απαιτήσεις μηχανικής λογισμικού και είναι αφιερωμένο στην αραβική γλώσσα, ειδικά στη σύγχρονη τυποποιημένη αραβική και μαροκινή διάλεκτο. Μετά από μια δεκαετία ολοκλήρωσης και ανάπτυξης, η SAFAR διαθέτει σήμερα περισσότερα από 50 εργαλεία και πόρους που μπορούν να αξιοποιηθούν είτε χρησιμοποιώντας το API της είτε χρησιμοποιώντας τη διεπαφή ιστού της.', 'kk': 'Араб NLP арқылы бірнеше құралдар мен ресурстар жасалған. Бірақ бұл компоненттерді жинайтын гомоген және гибсиялық араб ортасы жеткізілмейді. Бұл перспективде, біз SAFAR-ды бір тілдегі бағдарламаның инженерлік қажеттеріне сәйкес жасалған, әсіресе Араб тіліне ұсынатын, әдетте қазіргі араб және Мароккан диалекті. Бір ондық жылдық интеграциялық және құрылғысының соңында, SAFAR бұл күнінде 50 құрал мен ресурстардан артық болады. Осы API не оның веб интерфейсін қолдануға болады.', 'lt': 'Several tools and resources have been developed to deal with Arabic NLP.  However, a homogenous and flexible Arabic environment that gathers these components is rarely available.  Šiuo požiūriu įvedame SAFAR, kuri yra vienakalbė sistema, sukurta pagal programinės įrangos in žinerijos reikalavimus ir skirta arabų kalbai, ypač šiuolaikiniam standartiniam arabų ir maroko dialektui. After one decade of integration and development, SAFAR possesses today more than 50 tools and resources that can be exploited either using its API or using its web interface.', 'mk': 'Several tools and resources have been developed to deal with Arabic NLP.  Сепак, хомогена и флексибилна арапска средина која ги собира овие компоненти ретко е достапна. In this perspective, we introduce SAFAR which is a monolingual framework developed in accordance with software engineering requirements and dedicated to Arabic language, especially, the modern standard Arabic and Moroccan dialect.  По една деценија интеграција и развој, САФАР денес поседува повеќе од 50 алатки и ресурси кои може да се искористат или со користење на својот АПИ или со користење на својот веб-интерфејс.', 'ms': 'Several tools and resources have been developed to deal with Arabic NLP.  However, a homogenous and flexible Arabic environment that gathers these components is rarely available.  Dalam perspektif ini, kami memperkenalkan SAFAR yang merupakan kerangka monobahasa yang dikembangkan sesuai dengan peraturan perisian dan dedikasi kepada bahasa Arab, terutama, dialekt Arab dan Maroko standar modern. After one decade of integration and development, SAFAR possesses today more than 50 tools and resources that can be exploited either using its API or using its web interface.', 'ml': 'അറബി എംഎല്\u200dപിയുമായി കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യാന്\u200d പല ഉപകരണങ്ങളും വിഭവങ്ങളും സൃഷ്ടിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. However, a homogenous and flexible Arabic environment that gathers these components is rarely available.  ഈ കാഴ്ചപ്പാടില്\u200d, നാം സാഫാരെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. സോഫ്റ്റ്\u200cവെയര്\u200d എഞ്ചിനീയറിന്\u200dറെ ആവശ്യങ്ങള്\u200d അനുസരിച്ച് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട സാഫ്രെയിമാല്\u200d ഫ് ഒരു പത്ത് വര്\u200dഷത്തിനു ശേഷം സഫാര്\u200d ഇന്ന് 50 ഉപകരണങ്ങളും വിഭവങ്ങളും ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അതിന്റെ API ഉപയോഗിക്കുകയോ അതിന്റെ വെബ് ഇന്\u200dറര്\u200dമ', 'mt': 'Ġew żviluppati diversi għodod u riżorsi biex jittrattaw il-NLP Għarab. However, a homogenous and flexible Arabic environment that gathers these components is rarely available.  F’din il-perspettiva, a ħna nintroduċu s-SAFAR li huwa qafas monolingwi żviluppat skont ir-rekwiżiti tal-in ġinerija tas-softwer u ddedikat għall-lingwa Għarbija, speċjalment, id-djalett standard modern Għarbi u Marokkin. Wara għaxar snin ta’ integrazzjoni u żvilupp, is-SAFAR illum għandu aktar minn 50 għodda u riżorsi li jistgħu jiġu sfruttati jew bl-użu tal-API tagħha jew bl-użu tal-interfaċċja tal-internet tagħha.', 'mn': 'Араб NLP-тэй зориулахын тулд олон хэрэгсэл болон нөөц баялаг хөгжүүлсэн. Гэхдээ эдгээр элементүүдийг цуглуулж буй адил ижил бөгөөд гишүүн Араб орчин ховор байдаг. Энэ тохиолдолд бид SAFAR-г илтгэнэ. Энэ бол програм хангамжийн инженерчлэлийн шаардлагатай, ялангуяа Араб хэл, орчин үеийн Араб болон Марокко диалектын стандарт. Хэдэн арван жилийн дараа SAFAR нь өнөөдөр 50 гаруй хэрэгсэл болон нөөцийг ашиглаж болох API эсвэл веб интерфейсийг ашиглаж болно.', 'pl': 'Opracowano kilka narzędzi i zasobów do radzenia sobie z arabskim NLP. Jednak jednorodne i elastyczne środowisko arabskie, które gromadzi te składniki, jest rzadko dostępne. W tej perspektywie wprowadzamy SAFAR, który jest jednojęzycznym frameworkiem opracowanym zgodnie z wymaganiami inżynierii oprogramowania i dedykowanym językowi arabskiemu, zwłaszcza nowoczesnemu standardowemu dialektowi arabskiemu i marokańskiemu. Po dekadzie integracji i rozwoju, SAFAR dysponuje dziś ponad pięćdziesięcioma narzędziami i zasobami, które można wykorzystać za pomocą interfejsu API lub interfejsu internetowego.', 'ro': 'Au fost dezvoltate mai multe instrumente și resurse pentru a face față PNL arab. Cu toate acestea, un mediu arab omogen și flexibil care adună aceste componente este rareori disponibil. În această perspectivă, introducem SAFAR, care este un cadru monolingv dezvoltat în conformitate cu cerințele ingineriei software și dedicat limbii arabe, în special, dialectului standard modern arab și marocan. După un deceniu de integrare și dezvoltare, SAFAR dispune astăzi de peste 50 de instrumente și resurse care pot fi exploatate fie folosind API-ul său, fie folosind interfața web.', 'sr': 'Razvijene su nekoliko alata i resursa za rješavanje arapskog NLP-a. Međutim, homogenovno i fleksibilno arapsko okruženje koje skuplja te komponente rijetko je dostupno. U ovoj perspektivi predstavljamo SAFAR koji je monojezički okvir razvijen u skladu sa zahtevima za in ženjerstvo softvera i posvećenim arapskom jeziku, posebno modernom standardnom arapskom i marokanskom dijalektu. Nakon decenija integracije i razvoja, SAFAR danas poseduje više od 50 alata i resursa koje mogu iskoristiti ili koristiti svoj API ili koristiti svoj web interfejs.', 'si': 'අරාබික් NLP එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් කිසිම උපකරණය සහ උපකරණය විකාශ කරලා තියෙනවා. නමුත්, මේ කොටස් එක්ක එකතු කරපු එක්ක සමාන්\u200dයයෙක් සහ අරාබික වාතාවයක්. මේ ප්\u200dරදේශයෙන්, අපි SAFAR එක්ක භාෂාවක් වලින් විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ සොෆ්ටව් ඉංජිනේර් අවශ්\u200dයය සහ අරාබි භාෂාවට අද SAFAR විශාලය සහ විකාශයේ දහස් පස්සේ, අද උපකරණය 50 වඩා වඩා සහ උපකරණය 50 වඩා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් ඒක API වියෝජනය කරන්', 'so': 'Qaar qalab iyo hanti ah ayaa loo hormariyey si ay ula macaamiloodaan Carabi NLP. Si kastaba ha ahaatee deegaanka Carabiga ee isku mid ah oo xigmad leh, ee soo ururiya qeybahaas, wax yar ayeey heli karaan. Fiirintan ayaan SAFAR ka soo bandhignaynaa, taas oo ah qoraal af dhaqan ah oo la horumariyey si waafaqsan baahida qoraalka injiilka software, oo loo gaaray luqada Carabiga, khusuusan qoraalka caadiga ah ee ugu horeeya Carabiga iyo Morokoki. Tan toban sano kadib SAFAR wuxuu leeyahay in ka badan 50 qalabka iyo resources oo lagu isticmaali karo API ama isticmaali karo Internetka.', 'sv': 'Flera verktyg och resurser har utvecklats för att hantera arabisk NLP. Men en homogen och flexibel arabisk miljö som samlar dessa komponenter är sällan tillgänglig. I detta perspektiv introducerar vi SAFAR som är ett enspråkigt ramverk utvecklat i enlighet med programvaruteknik krav och dedikerat till arabiska språk, särskilt den moderna standard arabiska och marockanska dialekten. Efter ett decennium av integration och utveckling har SAFAR idag mer än 50 verktyg och resurser som kan utnyttjas antingen med hjälp av dess API eller med hjälp av dess webbgränssnitt.', 'ta': 'அரேபிய NLP தொடர்பு கொள்ள பல கருவிகள் மற்றும் வளங்கள் உருவாக்கப்பட்டது. ஆனால், இந்த பொருளை ஒன்று சேர்க்கும் பொருட்கள் குறைவாகவே கிடைக்கும். இந்த காட்சியில், நாம் SAFAR ஒரு மென்பொருள் பொறியியல் தேவைகளைப் பொருத்தி உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ள ஒரு ஒற்றைமொழி சட்டத்தை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும ஒரு பத்தாண்டு ஒன்றுசேர்த்தல் மற்றும் உருவாக்கத்திற்கு பிறகு, SAFAR இன்று 50 க்கு மேற்பட்ட கருவிகள் மற்றும் வளங்கள் உரிமையுள்ளது அது அதன', 'no': 'fleire verktøy og ressursar er utvikla for å handtera arabiske NLP. Men ein homogenesk og fleksibel arabisk miljø som samler desse komponentane er ofte tilgjengeleg. I denne perspektiven introduserer vi SAFAR som er ein monospråk rammeverk utviklet i samsvar med programvareiningar-krev og spesielt til arabisk språk, spesielt den moderne arabiske og morokske dialekten. Etter ein tiåret av integrasjon og utvikling, har SAFAR i dag fleire enn 50 verktøy og ressursar som kan brukast enten med API eller bruka nettgrensesnittet.', 'ur': 'بہت سی ابزار اور منابع عربی NLP کے ساتھ استعمال کرنے کے لئے گھیرے گئے ہیں۔ لیکن، ایک ہمسائی اور ہمسائی عربی محیط جو ان قسموں کو جمع کرتا ہے بہت کم موجود ہے۔ اس نظر میں ہم SAFAR کو معرفی کرتے ہیں جو سوفٹر انجینر کی ضرورت کے مطابق ایک ہی زبان کا فرم ہے اور مخصوصا عربی زبان کے مطابق معرفی کیا گیا ہے۔ ایک دس سال کے بعد، سافار آج 50 سے زیادہ ابزار اور منابع ہیں جو اس کے API کے مطابق استعمال کر سکتے ہیں یا اس کے وب انتصاف کے مطابق استعمال کر سکتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Arab NLP bilan boshqarish uchun bir nechta asboblar va rasmlar yaratildi. Lekin, bu komponentlarni тўплайдиган homogen va fleksiblik arab muhiti juda qisqa mavjud emas. Bu ko'rinda, biz AFARni o'zgartiradik, dastur muhandislarning takliflari bilan yaratilgan o'zgaruvchi asboblar bilan o'zgarishga ega bo'lgan, hususan yangi oddiy arab va Morokonik dialekasi. Bir yil ichida bir yil birlashtirish va taʼminlovchi so'zlaridan keyin SAFAR bugun 50 dan ortiq asboblar va rasmlarni API bilan foydalanishi mumkin yoki veb interfeys bilan foydalanishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Một số công cụ và nguồn lực đã được phát triển để đối phó với LP Ả Rập. Tuy nhiên, rất hiếm khi có một môi trường y tế và linh hoạt bao gồm các thành phần này. Trong quan điểm này, chúng ta sẽ giới thiệu SAFARC là một cơ sở ngôn ngữ ngữ, được phát triển theo yêu cầu kỹ thuật phần mềm và được dành cho ngôn ngữ Ả Rập và địa phương Ma Rốc. Sau một thập kỷ hòa nhập và phát triển, SAFARC sở hữu nhiều hơn chục công cụ và nguồn lực có thể được sử dụng hoặc bằng API của nó hoặc sử dụng giao diện web.', 'hr': 'Razvijene su nekoliko alata i resursa za rješavanje arapskog NLP-a. Međutim, homogenovno i fleksibilno arapsko okruženje koje skuplja te komponente rijetko je dostupno. U ovoj perspektivi predstavljamo SAFAR koji je monojezički okvir razvijen u skladu s zahtjevima in ženjerstva softvera i posvećenim arapskom jeziku, posebno modernom standardnom arapskom i marokanskom dijalektu. Nakon desetljeća integracije i razvoja, SAFAR danas posjeduje više od 50 alata i resursa koje se mogu iskoristiti ili koristiti svoj API ili koristiti svoj web interfejs.', 'bg': 'Разработени са няколко инструмента и ресурси за справяне с арабското НЛП. Въпреки това, хомогенна и гъвкава арабска среда, която събира тези компоненти, рядко се предлага. В тази перспектива представяме САФАР, която е едноезична рамка, разработена в съответствие с изискванията за софтуерно инженерство и посветена на арабския език, особено съвременния стандартен арабски и марокански диалект. След десетилетие интеграция и развитие, днес притежава повече от 50 инструмента и ресурса, които могат да бъдат експлоатирани или с помощта на неговия интерфейс, или с помощта на неговия уеб интерфейс.', 'nl': 'Verschillende tools en bronnen zijn ontwikkeld om te gaan met Arabische NLP. Een homogene en flexibele Arabische omgeving die deze componenten verzamelt, is echter zelden beschikbaar. In dit perspectief introduceren we SAFAR, een eentalig raamwerk dat is ontwikkeld in overeenstemming met softwaretechnische vereisten en gewijd aan de Arabische taal, met name het moderne standaard Arabisch en Marokkaans dialect. Na een decennium van integratie en ontwikkeling beschikt SAFAR vandaag over meer dan 50 tools en resources die kunnen worden benut met behulp van zijn API of met behulp van zijn webinterface.', 'da': 'Flere værktøjer og ressourcer er blevet udviklet til at håndtere arabisk NLP. Men et homogent og fleksibelt arabisk miljø, der samler disse komponenter, er sjældent tilgængeligt. I dette perspektiv introducerer vi SAFAR, som er en ensproget ramme udviklet i overensstemmelse med software engineering krav og dedikeret til arabisk sprog, især den moderne standard arabisk og marokkansk dialekt. Efter et årti med integration og udvikling besidder SAFAR i dag mere end 50 værktøjer og ressourcer, der kan udnyttes enten ved hjælp af sin API eller ved hjælp af sin webgrænseflade.', 'id': 'Several tools and resources have been developed to deal with Arabic NLP.  Namun, lingkungan Arab homogen dan fleksibel yang mengumpulkan komponen ini jarang tersedia. Dalam perspektif ini, kami memperkenalkan SAFAR yang merupakan cadangan monobahasa yang dikembangkan sesuai dengan kebutuhan perangkat lunak dan didedikasikan untuk bahasa Arab, terutama, dialekt Arab dan Maroko standar modern. Setelah satu dekade integrasi dan pengembangan, SAFAR memiliki hari ini lebih dari 50 alat dan sumber daya yang dapat dieksploitasi baik menggunakan API-nya atau menggunakan antaramuka web-nya.', 'de': 'Mehrere Tools und Ressourcen wurden entwickelt, um mit arabischem NLP umzugehen. Eine homogene und flexible arabische Umgebung, die diese Komponenten sammelt, ist jedoch selten verfügbar. In dieser Perspektive stellen wir SAFAR vor, ein einsprachiges Framework, das in Übereinstimmung mit den Anforderungen der Softwareentwicklung entwickelt wurde und sich der arabischen Sprache widmet, insbesondere dem modernen Standard-arabischen und marokkanischen Dialekt. Nach einem Jahrzehnt der Integration und Entwicklung verfügt SAFAR heute über über 50-Tools und Ressourcen, die entweder über seine API oder über seine Weboberfläche genutzt werden können.', 'ko': '아랍어 NLP를 처리하기 위한 도구와 자원을 개발했다.그러나 이런 구성 요소의 동질적이고 유연한 아랍어 환경을 수집하는 것은 매우 드물다.이런 측면에서 볼 때 우리는 SAFAR를 소개할 것이다. 이것은 소프트웨어 공학의 요구에 따라 개발된 단어 구조로 아랍어, 특히 현대 표준 아랍어와 모로코 사투리에 전문적으로 사용된다.10년 동안의 통합과 개발을 거쳐 SAFAR는 현재 50여 개의 도구와 자원을 가지고 있으며 API나 웹 인터페이스를 이용하여 개발할 수 있다.', 'fa': 'برای حل با NLP عربی چند ابزار و منابع توسعه شده است. با این حال، یک محیط همجنس و قابل flexible عربی که این بخش ها را جمع می کند کمی در دسترس است. در این perspektiv، ما SAFAR را معرفی می کنیم که یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار توسعه با نیازهای مهندسی نرم\u200cافزار و به زبان عربی، مخصوصاً دیالکت است بعد از یک دهه تکامل و توسعه، SAFAR امروز بیش از ۵۰ ابزار و منابع دارد که می توانند با استفاده از API یا از interface ش وب استفاده کنند.', 'sw': 'Vifaa kadhaa na rasilimali zimeendelea kukabiliana na NLP ya Kiarabu. Hata hivyo, mazingira ya Kiarabu yenye ushoga na yenye uchunguzi yanayokusanya vifaa hivi ni nadra sana. In this perspective, we introduce SAFAR which is a monolingual framework developed in accordance with software engineering requirements and dedicated to Arabic language, especially, the modern standard Arabic and Moroccan dialect.  Baada ya muongo mmoja wa ushirikiano na maendeleo, SAFAR inamiliki leo zaidi ya zana na rasilimali 50 ambazo zinaweza kutumiwa au kutumia API au kutumia mtandao wake wa intaneti.', 'af': "Verskeie nutsprogramme en hulpbronne is ontwikkeld om met Arabiese NLP te handel. Maar 'n homogenous en fleksibel Arabiese omgewing wat hierdie komponente versamel is onklok beskikbaar. In hierdie perspektief, introduseer ons SAFAR wat 'n monolinglike raamwerk is ontwikkeld in ooreenkomstig sagteware in ženiering benodigte en geassosieer aan Arabske taal, veral, die moderne standaard Arabske en Marokke dialekte. Na een dekade integrasie en ontwikkeling het SAFAR vandag meer as 50 nutsprogramme en hulpbronne besit wat kan gebruik word of met sy API of sy web koppelvlak.", 'tr': "Arap NLP bilen çözmek üçin birnäçe sany we çeşmeler gelişmediler. Ýöne bu a ýratyny ýygnaýan homogenus we fleksible arabça ortamy düýpdir. Bu perspektive biz SAFAR'i, softwaryň in ženjeriýasynyň gereklikleri bilen gelişmegi we özellikle arap diline wezip eden, häzirki moderni arap we Marokan dialektinden tanyşdyrýarys. On ýyl integrasy we gelişmeden soň, SAFAR şu gün 50 sanyndan köp esbaplar we çeşmeleri bar. Olar ya APIsini ulanyp, ya da web interfesini ulanyp biljek bolýar.", 'sq': 'Disa mjete dhe burime janë zhvilluar për të trajtuar NLP arabe. Megjithatë, një mjedis homogjen dhe fleksibel arab që mbledh këto komponente është rrallë në dispozicion. Në këtë perspektivë, ne futim SAFAR i cili është një kuadër monogjuhësor i zhvilluar në përputhje me kërkesat e inxhinierisë së softuereve dhe i përkushtuar gjuhës arabe, veçanërisht dialektit modern standard arab dhe marokon. Pas një dekade integrimi dhe zhvillimi, SAFAR zotëron sot më shumë se 50 mjete dhe burime që mund të shfrytëzohen ose duke përdorur API-në e saj ose duke përdorur interfaqen e saj në internet.', 'am': 'በአረብኛ NLP ጋር ለመቀጠል ብዙ መሣሪያዎችና ሀብትዎች ተዘጋጅተዋል፡፡ ነገር ግን እነዚህን ሰንቨሮች የሚያከማችል አረብ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ ፍጥረት በጣም ጥቂት ነው፡፡ በዚህ ዓይነት፣ የሶፍትዌር ኢንጂንተር ግንኙነት እና ለዐረብኛ ቋንቋ፣ ይልቁንም የአሁኑን ዓረብኛ ዓረብኛ እና ሞሮክኮን አካባቢ ቋንቋ የተለየውን የነፃ ቋንቋ አፍሪካን እናገልጣለን፡፡ ከአንድ አሥር ዓመታት በኋላ SAFAR ዛሬ በAPI ወይም በመጠቀም ወይም በመረብ Interface የሚጠቀም 50 የሀብት መሣሪያና ሀብት የሚጨምረው ነው፡፡', 'az': "Arab NLP ilə çəkinmək üçün bir neçə vasitələr və kaynaklar təhsil edildi. Ancaq bu komponentləri toplayan homogenon və fleksib ərəb çevresində çox az faydalanır. Bu perspektivdə, biz SAFAR'ı tanıdırırıq ki, proqram mühendisliyinin müəyyənləşdirilməsi və ərəb dilinə bağlı olan, özlərinə də, moderni ərəb və Marokan dialekti olan bir monodilli frameworkdir. On ildən sonra, SAFAR bu gün, API və ya web interfejsini istifadə edə biləcək 50 vasitələrdən çox və resurslar var.", 'hy': 'Բազմաթիվ գործիքներ և ռեսուրսներ են զարգացել արաբական ՆԼՊ-ի հետ կապված գործողությունների համար: However, a homogenous and flexible Arabic environment that gathers these components is rarely available.  Այս տեսանկյունից մենք ներկայացնում ենք Safer-ը, որը միալեզու շրջանակ է, որը զարգացվել է համաձայն ծրագրային ճարտարագիտության պահանջներին և նվիրված է արաբերական լեզվին, հատկապես ժամանակակից ստանդարտ արաբերական և մարոքի դիալեկտին: Մի տասնամյակ ինտեգրացիայի և զարգացման հետո, այսօր Սաֆարը ունի ավելի քան 50 գործիք և ռեսուրսներ, որոնք կարող են օգտագործվել կամ օգտագործելով իր API-ը, կամ օգտագործելով իր վեբ ինտերֆեյսը:', 'bs': 'Razvijene su nekoliko alata i resursa za rješavanje arapskog NLP-a. Međutim, homogenovno i fleksibilno arapsko okruženje koje skuplja te komponente rijetko je dostupno. U ovoj perspektivi predstavljamo SAFAR koji je monojezički okvir razvijen u skladu sa zahtjevima za in ženjerstvo softvera i posvećenim arapskom jeziku, posebno modernom standardnom arapskom i marokanskom dijalektu. Nakon desetljeća integracije i razvoja, SAFAR danas posjeduje više od 50 alata i resursa koje mogu iskoristiti ili koristiti svoj API ili koristiti svoj web interfejs.', 'bn': 'আরবী এনএলপির সাথে চুক্তি করার জন্য বেশ কয়েকটি টুল ও সম্পদ উন্নয়ন করা হয়েছে। তবে একটি সমকামী এবং flexible আরবী পরিবেশ যা এই অংশগুলোকে জমা করে তা খুব কম পাওয়া যায়। এই দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিতে আমরা সফটওয়্যার ইঞ্জিনিয়ার প্রয়োজন এবং আরবী ভাষায় উৎসর্গ করে সাফারের সাথে পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি, বিশেষ করে আধুনিক স্থানীয় আরবী এবং মরোক্কো After one decade of integration and development, SAFAR possesses today more than 50 tools and resources that can be exploited either using its API or using its web interface.', 'et': 'Araabia uue programmiga tegelemiseks on välja töötatud mitmeid vahendeid ja ressursse. Kuid ühtlane ja paindlik araabia keskkond, mis koondab neid komponente, on harva kättesaadav. Selles perspektiivis tutvustame SAFAR-i, mis on ühekeelne raamistik, mis on välja töötatud vastavalt tarkvaratehnika nõuetele ja pühendatud araabia keelele, eriti kaasaegsele standardsele araabia ja Maroko murdele. Pärast kümnendit kestnud integratsiooni- ja arendustegevust on SAFARil tänapäeval üle 50 tööriista ja ressursi, mida saab kasutada kas API või veebiliidese abil.', 'cs': 'Pro řešení arabského NLP bylo vyvinuto několik nástrojů a zdrojů. Nicméně homogenní a flexibilní arabské prostředí, které shromažďuje tyto složky, je zřídka k dispozici. V této perspektivě představujeme SAFAR, což je monojazyčný rámec vyvinutý v souladu s požadavky softwarového inženýrství a věnovaný arabskému jazyku, zejména modernímu standardnímu arabskému a marockému dialektu. Po desetiletí integrace a vývoje má SAFAR dnes více než padesát nástrojů a zdrojů, které lze využít buď pomocí API, nebo pomocí webového rozhraní.', 'ca': "S'han desenvolupat diverses eines i recursos per tractar amb el NLP àrab. Però rarament hi ha un entorn àrab homogen i flexible que recoll aquests components. En aquesta perspectiva, introduïm SAFAR que és un marc monolingüe desenvolupat de acord amb els requisits d'enginyeria de software i dedicat a la llengua àrab, especialment el dialecte àrab i marocani moderns. Després d'una dècada d'integració i desenvolupament, el SAFAR avui en dia posseeix més de 50 eines i recursos que poden ser explotats utilitzant la seva API o utilitzant la seva interfície web.", 'fi': 'Arabian NLP:n käsittelemiseksi on kehitetty useita työkaluja ja resursseja. Kuitenkin homogeeninen ja joustava arabialainen ympäristö, joka kerää nämä komponentit, on harvoin saatavilla. Tässä perspektiivissä esittelemme SAFARin, joka on yksikielinen kehys, joka on kehitetty ohjelmistosuunnittelun vaatimusten mukaisesti ja omistettu arabian kielelle, erityisesti nykyaikaiselle standardille arabian ja marokkolaisen murteelle. Kymmenen vuoden integraation ja kehityksen jälkeen SAFARilla on nykyään yli 50 työkalua ja resurssia, joita voidaan hyödyntää joko API:n tai web-käyttöliittymän avulla.', 'sk': 'Za obravnavanje arabskega NLP je bilo razvitih več orodij in virov. Vendar pa je homogeno in prilagodljivo arabsko okolje, ki zbira te komponente, redko na voljo. S tega vidika predstavljamo SAFAR, ki je enojezični okvir, razvit v skladu z zahtevami programskega inženiringa in namenjen arabskemu jeziku, zlasti sodobnemu standardnemu arabskemu in maroškemu narečju. Po desetletju integracije in razvoja ima SAFAR danes več kot 50 orodij in virov, ki jih je mogoče izkoristiti z uporabo API-ja ali spletnega vmesnika.', 'ha': "An developed several tools and resource to address Arabic NLP. A lokacin da, wata mazaɓa mai gayo da wanda yake iya lokacin Larabci wanda ke samun waɗannan compobuɗu da ɗan daɗi ne. Daga wannan muhimmani, Munã ƙara SAFR wanda aka samar da shi na wata firam na sauri da kuma aka ƙayyade shi a cikin harshen Larabci, kuma, hasa'a, matabbatar da taƙaita ta farko na Larabci da Marokki. Bayan shekara guda na haɗi da Development, SAFR yana da mafiya yawa a yau na ƙari 50 tools da resource wanda za'a yi amfani da ko kuma za'a yi amfani da amfani da kwamfyutan EMI ko kuma a yi amfani da cinikinsa.", 'jv': 'Sampeyan akeh alat lan akeh sing ditambah kanggo mbatalé karo NLP arab. Nanging, kita sampeyan karo perusahaan sampeyan karo akeh lan nganggo-akeh sing sampeyan karo sapa-akeh sing larang ning acara sak kudu nêmên. Nanging perspeksi iki, kéné nglanggar SMARR sing sampeyan kanggo nyuggu kanggo nyebutaké software ing nggawe barang basa arap, padha uga, awak dhéwé basa arap lan Marokan kuwi dialecto awak dhéwé. Sugeng blok sing wis rampung ingkang karo ingkang nggawe, sarar kang dipunangé sampeyan ingkang sampeyan luwih dumadhi pedané perusahaan karo perusahaan sing bisa sewis dipunangé Api karo nggambar tarjamahan web dhéwé.', 'bo': 'ཨ་རབ་ཀྱི་NLP དང་མཐུད་སྣེ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་ལག་ཆ་དང་ཐོན་ཁུངས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཆགས་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། ཆ་ཤས་འདི་དག་སྒྲིག་མཁན་དེ་བསྡོམས་པའི་སྐྱེས་ཆེན་དང་flexible སྒྲིག་གི་ཨ་རིའི་གཞུང་ཐོག་ཏུ་ཉར་ཆེ་བ་ In this perspective, we introduce SAFAR which is a monolingual framework developed in accordance with software engineering requirements and dedicated to Arabic language, especially, the modern standard Arabic and Moroccan dialect. After one decade of integration and development, SAFAR has today more than 50 tools and resources that can be exploited either using its API or using its web interface.', 'he': 'פיתחו מספר כלים ומשאבים כדי להתמודד עם NLP ערבית. עם זאת, סביבה ערבית הומוגנית וגמישה שאספת את המרכיבים הללו נדירות זמינה. בפרספקטיבה הזו, אנו מכירים את SAFAR שהוא מסגר מונולשוני שפותח לפי דרישות הנדסה תוכנית ומוקדש לשפה ערבית, במיוחד, הדיאלקט הסטנדרטי המודרני ערבי ומרוקני. לאחר עשור של אינטגרציה ופיתוח, SAFAR מחזיק היום יותר מ-50 כלים ומשאבים שאפשר לנצל או באמצעות API שלה או באמצעות ממשק האינטרנט שלה.'}
{'en': 'LOME : Large Ontology Multilingual Extraction', 'ar': 'LOME: استخراج متعدد اللغات لعلم الوجود الكبير', 'fr': 'LOME\xa0: Extraction multilingue de grandes ontologies', 'pt': 'LOME: Large Ontology Multilingual Extraction', 'es': 'LOME: Extracción multilingüe de ontología grande', 'ja': 'LOME:大規模なオントロジー多言語抽出', 'hi': 'LOME: बड़े ओंटोलॉजी बहुभाषी निष्कर्षण', 'ru': 'LOME: Крупная многоязычная экстракция онтологии', 'zh': 'LOME:大体多言', 'ga': 'LOME: Eastóscadh Ilteangach Ontology Móra', 'el': 'LOME: Μεγάλη Οντολογία Πολυγλωσσική Εκχύλισμα', 'hu': 'LOME: Nagy Ontológia Többnyelvű extrakció', 'kk': 'LOME: Үлкен онтология көп тілді тарқату', 'it': 'LOME: Large Ontology Multilingual Extraction', 'lt': 'LOME: Didelė Ontologija daugiakalbė ekstrakcija', 'ms': 'LOME: Ekstraksi Berbahasa Ontologi Besar', 'ml': 'LOME: വലുതായ ഒണ്ടോളജി പലഭാഷ പുറത്താക്കുക', 'mk': 'ЛОМЕ: Голема онтологија Мултијазична екстракција', 'mn': 'LOME: Том онтологийн олон хэлний нээв', 'mt': 'LOME: Ontoloġija Kbar Estrazzjoni Multilingwi', 'pl': 'LOME: Duża ontologiczna ekstrakcja wielojęzyczna', 'ro': 'LOME: Extracţie multilingvă de Ontologie mare', 'ka': 'LOME: დიდი Ontology Multilingual Extraction', 'so': 'LOME: Soo bixinta luuqadaha badan', 'si': 'LOME: ලොකු ඇන්ටෝලෝජික විශාල භාෂාවක් නිකිරීම', 'sv': 'LOME: Stor ontologi Flerspråkig extraktion', 'no': 'Constellation name (optional)', 'sr': 'Velika ontologija višejezička ekstrakcija', 'ta': 'LOME: பெரிய இணைப்பு பல மொழிகள் பிரித்தல்', 'ur': 'LOME: بہت بڑی انٹولوجی Multilingual Extraction', 'uz': 'LOME: Katta bir tillar ajratish', 'vi': 'LOME: Large Ontology diệt ngôn ngữ', 'bg': 'LOME: Голяма онтологична многоезична екстракция', 'da': 'LOME: Large Ontology Multilingual Extraction', 'hr': 'LOME: Velika Ontologija višejezička izvlačenja', 'nl': 'LOME: Grote Ontologie Meertalige Extractie', 'de': 'LOME: Große Ontologie Mehrsprachige Extraktion', 'id': 'LOME: Ekstraksi Berbahasa Ontologi Besar', 'fa': 'LOME: اخراج چند زبان انٹولوژی بزرگ', 'ko': 'LOME: 대형 본체 다중 언어 추출', 'sw': 'LOME: Utoa wa lugha nyingi', 'tr': 'LOME: Ullakan Ontologiýa Birden Dilli Açmak', 'af': 'Constellation name (optional)', 'am': 'ቦታ፦', 'hy': 'ԼՕՄ՝ Մեծ օնտելոգիա բազլեզու արտահանումը', 'az': 'LOME: Büyük Ontologiya çoxlu dil Extraction', 'sq': 'LOME: Ekstraktim i madh i Ontologjisë Shumë-gjuhëse', 'bn': 'LOME: বড় অনটলোগি বহুভাষায় এক্সট্র্যাকশন', 'bs': 'LOME: Velika Ontologija Multilingual Extraction', 'cs': 'LOME: Velká ontologická vícejazyčná extrakce', 'ca': 'LOME: Extracció multilingüe de gran ontologia', 'fi': 'LOME: Large Ontology Multilingual Extraction', 'et': 'LOME: Suur Ontoloogia mitmekeelne ekstraheerimine', 'jv': 'LOME: Ontologgi Multilanguage extract', 'sk': 'LOME: večjezično ekstrakcijo velike Ontologije', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'הוצאת אונטולוגיה גדולה רבות שפות', 'bo': 'LOME: སྐད་རིགས་དབྱིབས་ཆེན་པོ་ཆེ་བ་ཞུགས་བཤེར་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'We present LOME, a system for performing multilingual information extraction. Given a text document as input, our core system identifies spans of textual entity and event mentions with a FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998) parser. It subsequently performs coreference resolution, fine-grained entity typing, and temporal relation prediction between events. By doing so, the system constructs an event and entity focused knowledge graph. We can further apply third-party modules for other types of annotation, like relation extraction. Our (multilingual) first-party modules either outperform or are competitive with the (monolingual) state-of-the-art. We achieve this through the use of multilingual encoders like XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) and leveraging multilingual training data. LOME is available as a Docker container on Docker Hub. In addition, a lightweight version of the system is accessible as a web demo.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos o LOME, um sistema para extração de informações multilíngues. Dado um documento de texto como entrada, nosso sistema central identifica extensões de entidade textual e menções de eventos com um analisador FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998). Em seguida, ele executa resolução de correferência, tipagem de entidade refinada e previsão de relação temporal entre eventos. Ao fazer isso, o sistema constrói um grafo de conhecimento focado em eventos e entidades. Podemos ainda aplicar módulos de terceiros para outros tipos de anotação, como extração de relação. Nossos módulos primários (multilíngues) superam ou são competitivos com os módulos (monolíngues) de última geração. Conseguimos isso usando codificadores multilíngues como XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) e aproveitando dados de treinamento multilíngues. O LOME está disponível como um contêiner do Docker no Docker Hub. Além disso, uma versão leve do sistema pode ser acessada como uma demonstração na web.', 'fr': "Nous présentons LOME, un système d'extraction d'informations multilingues. À partir d'un document texte en entrée, notre système de base identifie les plages d'entités textuelles et de mentions d'événements à l'aide d'un analyseur FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998). Il effectue ensuite une résolution de coréférence, un typage d'entité précis et une prédiction de relation temporelle entre les événements. Ce faisant, le système construit un graphe de connaissances axé sur les événements et les entités. Nous pouvons également appliquer des modules tiers pour d'autres types d'annotations, comme l'extraction de relations. Nos modules de premier niveau (multilingues) surpassent ou sont compétitifs par rapport à la technologie de pointe (monolingue). Nous y parvenons grâce à l'utilisation d'encodeurs multilingues tels que XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) et à l'exploitation de données de formation multilingues. LOME est disponible sous forme de conteneur Docker sur Docker Hub. De plus, une version allégée du système est accessible sous forme de démonstration Web.", 'ar': 'نقدم LOME ، وهو نظام لأداء استخراج المعلومات متعدد اللغات. بالنظر إلى مستند نصي كمدخل ، يحدد نظامنا الأساسي نطاقات من الكيان النصي ويذكر الأحداث باستخدام محلل FrameNet (Baker et al. ، 1998). يقوم لاحقًا بإجراء تحليل المرجع ، وكتابة الكيانات الدقيقة ، والتنبؤ بالعلاقة الزمنية بين الأحداث. من خلال القيام بذلك ، ينشئ النظام رسمًا بيانيًا معرفيًا يركز على الحدث والكيان. يمكننا أيضًا تطبيق وحدات تابعة لجهات خارجية لأنواع أخرى من التعليقات التوضيحية ، مثل استخراج العلاقة. تتفوق وحدات الطرف الأول (متعددة اللغات) الخاصة بنا في الأداء أو تنافسية مع أحدث التقنيات (أحادية اللغة). نحقق ذلك من خلال استخدام برامج التشفير متعددة اللغات مثل XLM-R (Conneau et al. ، 2020) والاستفادة من بيانات التدريب متعددة اللغات. LOME متاح كحاوية Docker في Docker Hub. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، يمكن الوصول إلى إصدار خفيف الوزن من النظام كعرض ويب.', 'es': 'Presentamos LOME, un sistema para realizar extracción de información multilingüe. Dado un documento de texto como entrada, nuestro sistema central identifica tramos de entidades textuales y menciones de eventos con un analizador FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998). Posteriormente, realiza la resolución de correferencias, la tipificación detallada de entidades y la predicción de relaciones temporales entre eventos. Al hacerlo, el sistema construye un gráfico de conocimiento centrado en eventos y entidades. Podemos aplicar módulos de terceros para otros tipos de anotación, como la extracción de relaciones. Nuestros módulos propios (multilingües) superan o compiten con el estado de vanguardia (monolingüe). Lo logramos mediante el uso de codificadores multilingües como XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) y el aprovechamiento de los datos de capacitación multilingües. LOME está disponible como contenedor Docker en Docker Hub. Además, se puede acceder a una versión ligera del sistema como demostración web.', 'zh': '我们介绍LOME,一种用多言语信息提取的系统。 给定文本文档输入,我们的核心系统用FrameNet(Baker等,1998)解析器识文本实体和事件提及的跨度。 既而行配量解析、细粒度类型化事之占。 如此者,统构一以事体为心图谱。 更须第三方模块注,如关提取。 吾(多言)第一模块优于(单语)先进之模块,或有竞争力。 吾以XLM-R言编码器(Conneau等,2020)以多言练数而成之。 LOME 可为 Docker Hub 上 Docker 器用。 此外系统轻量级版本可为Web演访。', 'ja': '多言語情報抽出を実行するためのシステムであるLOMEをご紹介します。入力としてテキストドキュメントが与えられた場合、当社のコアシステムは、FrameNetパーサーを使用してテキストエンティティとイベントのスパンを識別します（ Baker et al., 1998 ）。その後、コアレファレンス解像度、細かいエンティティのタイピング、イベント間の時間関係の予測を実行します。これにより、システムはイベントとエンティティに焦点を当てたナレッジグラフを構築します。関係抽出などの他の種類のアノテーションには、サードパーティ製モジュールをさらに適用できます。当社の（多言語の）ファーストパーティモジュールは、（独語の）最先端のものよりも優れているか、または競争力があります。これは、XLM - R （ Conneau et al., 2020 ）のような多言語エンコーダを使用し、多言語トレーニングデータを活用することによって実現します。LOMEはDocker HubのDockerコンテナとして利用できます。さらに、Webデモとして軽量版のシステムにアクセスできます。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем LOME, систему для выполнения многоязычного извлечения информации. Учитывая текстовый документ в качестве входных данных, наша базовая система идентифицирует диапазоны текстовых сущностей и упоминаний событий с помощью анализатора FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998). Впоследствии он выполняет разрешение ядра, мелкозернистое типирование сущностей и прогнозирование временной связи между событиями. Поступая таким образом, система строит граф знаний, ориентированный на события и сущности. Кроме того, мы можем применять сторонние модули для других типов аннотаций, таких как извлечение отношений. Наши (многоязычные) модули первой стороны либо превосходят, либо конкурируют с (одноязычными) современными модулями. Мы достигаем этого за счет использования многоязычных кодировщиков, таких как XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020), и использования многоязычных обучающих данных. LOME доступен в виде Docker-контейнера на Docker Hub. Кроме того, облегченная версия системы доступна в виде веб-демонстрации.', 'hi': 'हम LOME, बहुभाषी जानकारी निष्कर्षण प्रदर्शन करने के लिए एक प्रणाली प्रस्तुत करते हैं। इनपुट के रूप में एक पाठ दस्तावेज़ को देखते हुए, हमारा मुख्य सिस्टम पाठ्य इकाई के स्पैन की पहचान करता है और एक फ्रेमनेट (बेकर एट अल। यह बाद में coreference संकल्प, ठीक दाने वाली इकाई टाइपिंग, और घटनाओं के बीच अस्थायी संबंध भविष्यवाणी करता है। ऐसा करने से, सिस्टम एक घटना और इकाई केंद्रित ज्ञान ग्राफ का निर्माण करता है। हम आगे अन्य प्रकार के एनोटेशन के लिए तीसरे पक्ष के मॉड्यूल लागू कर सकते हैं, जैसे संबंध निष्कर्षण। हमारे (बहुभाषी) प्रथम-पक्ष मॉड्यूल या तो बेहतर प्रदर्शन करते हैं या (मोनोलिंगुअल) स्टेट-ऑफ-द-आर्ट के साथ प्रतिस्पर्धी हैं। हम इसे XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) जैसे बहुभाषी एन्कोडर के उपयोग और बहुभाषी प्रशिक्षण डेटा का लाभ उठाने के माध्यम से प्राप्त करते हैं। LOME डॉकर हब पर एक डॉकर कंटेनर के रूप में उपलब्ध है। इसके अलावा, सिस्टम का एक हल्का संस्करण वेब डेमो के रूप में सुलभ है।', 'ga': 'Cuirimid LOME i láthair, córas chun eastóscadh faisnéise ilteangach a dhéanamh. I bhfianaise doiciméad téacs mar ionchur, aithníonn ár gcroíchóras raonta aonáin théacsúla agus luaitear imeachtaí le parsálaí FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998). Ina dhiaidh sin déanann sé taifeach croí-chomhdhála, clóscríobh aonáin mhínghlanta, agus tuar caidreamh ama idir imeachtaí. Trí seo a dhéanamh, déanann an córas graf eolais atá dírithe ar imeachtaí agus ar aonáin. Is féidir linn modúil tríú páirtí a chur i bhfeidhm tuilleadh le haghaidh cineálacha eile nótaí, amhail eastóscadh gaol. Feidhmíonn ár modúil chéad pháirtí (iltheangacha) níos fearr nó tá siad iomaíoch leis an stát (aonteangach) den scoth. Bainimid é seo amach trí úsáid a bhaint as ionchódóirí ilteangacha cosúil le XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) agus trí shonraí oiliúna ilteangacha a ghiaráil. Tá LOME ar fáil mar choimeádán Docker ar Docker Hub. Ina theannta sin, tá leagan éadrom den chóras inrochtana mar thaispeántas gréasáin.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a LOME-t, egy többnyelvű információkinyerési rendszert. Egy szöveges dokumentum bemenetként történő meghatározásával alapvető rendszerünk a szöveges entitások és eseményemlítések tartományát egy FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998) elemzővel azonosítja. Ezt követően elvégzi a coreferencia felbontást, a finomszemcsés entitás-tipizálást és az események közötti időbeli kapcsolat előrejelzést. Ezzel a rendszer egy esemény- és entitásközpontú tudásdiagráfot készít. Továbbá harmadik féltől származó modulokat is alkalmazhatunk más típusú megjegyzésekhez, például kapcsolatkivonáshoz. A (többnyelvű) első fél moduljaink vagy felülmúlják a teljesítményt, vagy versenyképesek a (egynyelvű) korszerűséggel. Ezt az XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) többnyelvű útmérők használatával és a többnyelvű képzési adatok felhasználásával érjük el. A LOME Docker tárolóként érhető el a Docker Hub-on. Ezenkívül a rendszer könnyű változata elérhető webes demóként.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მრავალენგური ინფორმაციის ექსტრექციის სისტემის გამოყენება LOME. ტექსტის დოკუმენტი როგორც შეტყობინება, ჩვენი მუშაო სისტემა ტექსტულ ინტერტიკური და მოვლენტის განსხვავება FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998) პანსერით. შემდეგ ის გავაკეთებს წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენები, წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენები და გერმალური დაკავშირების წარმოდგენები მოვლენების შორის. ეს გავაკეთებთ, სისტემა შექმნა მოვლენები და ინტერტიკის ფონსკურებული ცნობილების გრაფიკა. ჩვენ შეგვიძლია დამატებით მესამე-მხარეს მოდულების გამოყენება სხვა ტიპებისთვის ანოტაციებისთვის, როგორც კონტაციის გამოყენება. ჩვენი (მრავალენგური) პირველი ოჯახის მოდულები ან გავაკეთებულია ან კონპექტიურია (მონოლენგური) ხელსაწყოთან. ჩვენ მივიღეთ ეს მრავალენგური კოდერების გამოყენებით, როგორც XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) და მრავალენგური კოდერების მონაცემებით. LOME მოხდა როგორც Docker კონეტენერი Docker Hub- ში. დამატებით, სისტემის სისტემის მარტივი ვერსია საბოლო დემო შესაძლებელია.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα σύστημα για την εκτέλεση πολύγλωσσης εξόρυξης πληροφοριών. Δεδομένου ενός εγγράφου κειμένου ως εισαγωγή, το βασικό μας σύστημα εντοπίζει περιοχές κειμένων οντοτήτων και αναφορών συμβάντων με έναν αναλυτή FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998). Στη συνέχεια, εκτελεί την ανάλυση της συνάφειας, τον λεπτόκοκκο τύπο οντότητας και την πρόβλεψη χρονικής σχέσης μεταξύ συμβάντων. Με αυτόν τον τρόπο, το σύστημα κατασκευάζει ένα γράφημα γνώσης εστιασμένο σε γεγονότα και οντότητες. Μπορούμε περαιτέρω να εφαρμόσουμε ενότητες τρίτων για άλλους τύπους σχολιασμού, όπως η εξαγωγή σχέσεων. Οι (πολυγλωσσικές) ενότητες πρώτου μέρους είτε υπερτερούν είτε είναι ανταγωνιστικές με τις (μονογλωσσικές) σύγχρονες τεχνολογίες. Αυτό το επιτυγχάνουμε μέσω της χρήσης πολύγλωσσων κωδικοποιητών όπως και μέσω της αξιοποίησης πολύγλωσσων δεδομένων κατάρτισης. Το LOME είναι διαθέσιμο ως εμπορευματοκιβώτιο στον κόμβο. Επιπλέον, μια ελαφριά έκδοση του συστήματος είναι προσβάσιμη ως διαδικτυακή επίδειξη.', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome LOME, daugiakalbės informacijos gavimo sistemą. Atsižvelgiant į teksto dokumentą kaip įvestį, mūsų pagrindinė sistema nustato teksto subjekto ir įvykio aprėptis naudojant FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998) analizatorių. Vėliau ji atlieka koreferencinę pertvarką, smulkiai grūdintų subjektų tipavimą ir laiko santykių prognozę tarp įvykių. Tokiu būdu sistema sukuria renginių ir subjektų orientuotą žinių grafiką. Galime toliau taikyti trečiųjų šalių modulius kitų tipų anotacijoms, pvz., santykių išgavimui. Our (multilingual) first-party modules either outperform or are competitive with the (monolingual) state-of-the-art.  Tai pasiekiame naudojant daugiakalbius kodatorius, pvz., XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020), ir naudojant daugiakalbio mokymo duomenis. LOME tiekiamas Docker talpykloje Docker Hub. Be to, lengva sistemos versija yra prieinama kaip internetinė demonstracija.', 'it': "Vi presentiamo LOME, un sistema per l'estrazione di informazioni multilingue. Dato un documento di testo come input, il nostro sistema centrale identifica intervalli di entità testuali e menzioni di eventi con un parser FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998). Successivamente esegue la risoluzione di coreferenza, la tipizzazione di entità a grana fine e la previsione delle relazioni temporali tra gli eventi. Così facendo, il sistema costruisce un grafico della conoscenza focalizzato su eventi e entità. Possiamo inoltre applicare moduli di terze parti per altri tipi di annotazioni, come l'estrazione delle relazioni. I nostri moduli di prima parte (multilingue) superano o sono competitivi con lo stato dell'arte (monolingue). Lo raggiungiamo attraverso l'uso di encoder multilingue come XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) e sfruttando i dati di formazione multilingue. LOME è disponibile come contenitore Docker su Docker Hub. Inoltre, una versione leggera del sistema è accessibile come demo web.", 'mk': 'We present LOME, a system for performing multilingual information extraction.  Given a text document as input, our core system identifies spans of textual entity and event mentions with a FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998) parser.  It subsequently performs coreference resolution, fine-grained entity typing, and temporal relation prediction between events.  Со тоа, системот конструира граф на знаење фокусирано на настаните и ентитетите. We can further apply third-party modules for other types of annotation, like relation extraction.  Нашите (мултијазични) модули од првата партија или се надминуваат или се конкурентни со (монојазичните) најновите. We achieve this through the use of multilingual encoders like XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) and leveraging multilingual training data.  LOME е достапно како контејнер на Docker на Docker Hub. Покрај тоа, лесна верзија на системот е пристапна како веб демонстрација.', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan LOME, sistem untuk melakukan ekstraksi maklumat berbilang bahasa. Mengingat dokumen teks sebagai input, sistem utama kami mengenalpasti jangkauan entiti teks dan peristiwa disebut dengan penghurai FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998). Kemudian ia melaksanakan resolusi rujukan, penapisan entiti berwarna halus, dan ramalan hubungan sementara antara peristiwa. Dengan melakukannya, sistem membina graf pengetahuan yang fokus peristiwa dan entiti. We can further apply third-party modules for other types of annotation, like relation extraction.  Modul parti pertama kami (berbilang bahasa) sama ada melebihi atau bersaing dengan (monobahasa) state-of-the-art. Kita mencapainya melalui penggunaan pengekod berbilang bahasa seperti XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) dan menggunakan data latihan berbilang bahasa. LOME tersedia sebagai bekas Docker pada Docker Hub. Selain itu, versi ringan sistem boleh diakses sebagai demo web.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ലോമിനെ കാണിക്കുന്നു, പല ഭാഷ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രകടനം ചെയ്യാനുള്ള ഒരു സിസ്റ്റമാണ്. ഒരു ടെക്സ്റ്റെക്സ്റ്റ് രേഖയും ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് എന്നപോലെ കൊണ്ട്, ഞങ്ങളുടെ മൂല സിസ്റ്റമില്\u200d പദാവലിയുടെ സാധനങ്ങളും ഫ്രെമെനെറ്റിന്റ അതിനുശേഷം കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ് റിസ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d, നല്ല കിട്ടിയ വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d ടൈപ്പിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നതും, സംഭവങ്ങള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d സമയാ അങ്ങനെ ചെയ്താല്\u200d, സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d ഒരു സംഭവം ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. ശാസ്ത്രം ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന പരിജ്ഞാന ഗ്ര നമുക്ക് മൂന്നാം പാര്\u200dട്ടി മോഡ്യൂളുകള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും, മറ്റു തരം തരത്തിലുള്ള വിഷയത്തിന് വേണ്ടിയ Our (multilingual) first-party modules either outperform or are competitive with the (monolingual) state-of-the-art.  എക്സ്\u200cഎംഎം. എം. ആര്\u200d (കോണിയൂ എ, അല്\u200d, 2020) പോലെ പല ഭാഷ കോഡിനെക്കോഡുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിലൂടെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഇത് എത്തുന്നു. പല ഭാഷ പരി ഡോക്ടര്\u200d ഹുബിലെ ഡോക്ടര്\u200d കോണ്\u200dഡര്\u200d പോലെ ലഭ്യമാകുന്നു. കൂടാതെ, സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ലളിതമായ ഒരു പതിപ്പു് വെബ് ഡെമോയായി ലഭ്യമല്ല.', 'kk': 'Біз көп тілді мәліметті тарқату жүйесін LOME деп таңдаймыз. Мәтін құжатты келтіру ретінде, негізгі жүйеміз мәтін нысандар мен оқиғалар FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998) талдаушысының аралығын анықтайды. Содан кейін ол оқиғалардың арасындағы мәселелердің айырмашылығын, дұрыс түрлендіру және уақытша қатынасын көрсетеді. Жүйе оқиға мен білім графикасын құру үшін. Біз үшінші бөлім модульдерді басқа түрлерге қолдануға болады, мысалы, қатынасы тарқату секілді. Біздің (көп тілді) бірінші партиялық модульдеріміз немесе бірінші партиялық, немесе бірінші тілді орындың күйіне сәйкес келеді. Біз оны XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) секілді көп тілді кодерлерді қолдану мен көп тілді оқыту деректерін қолдану арқылы жеткіземіз. LOME докер хабтығында докер контейнері ретінде қол жеткізеді. Қосымша, жүйеңіздің көңіл нұсқасы веб демократиясы ретінде қол жеткізе алады.', 'mn': 'Бид олон хэл мэдээлэл гаргах системийг LOME-г тайлбарлаж байна. Текст бичгийг орлуулах боломжтой учраас, бидний үндсэн систем текст бүтээгдэхүүн болон үйл явдал FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998) хуваагдагчийг тодорхойлдог. Үүний дараа нь зөвхөн сайхан шийдвэрлэлт, сайхан жимс бичиж, хугацааны харилцаа үйл явдлын хоорондын холбоотой тодорхойлолт хийдэг. Үүнийг хийхэд систем нэг үйл явдал болон бүтээлч нь мэдлэг график төвлөрүүлдэг. Бид дахиад гуравдагч хэсэгт өөр төрлийн анзаарлыг ашиглаж болно. Бидний (олон хэлний) анхны партийн модуль нь үр дүнтэй эсвэл нэг хэлний урлагийн төвшинд өрсөлдөг. Бид үүнийг XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) шиг олон хэл хөгжүүлэгчдийг ашиглаж, олон хэл хөгжүүлэх өгөгдлийг ашиглаж чадна. LOME Docker Hub дээр Docker-ын контейнерүүд болно. Түүнчлэн системийн жингийн хувилбар веб-демократийн хувилбар болно.', 'pl': 'Prezentujemy LOME, system do wykonywania wielojęzycznej ekstrakcji informacji. Biorąc pod uwagę dokument tekstowy jako wejście, nasz podstawowy system identyfikuje zakresy jednostek tekstowych i wydarzeń za pomocą parsera FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998). Następnie wykonuje rozdzielczość współdziałania, precyzyjne typowanie jednostek i przewidywanie relacji czasowych między zdarzeniami. W ten sposób system buduje wykres wiedzy ukierunkowany na zdarzenia i podmioty. Możemy dodatkowo zastosować moduły innych firm do innych rodzajów adnotacji, takich jak ekstrakcja relacji. Nasze (wielojęzyczne) moduły pierwszej first party albo są lepsze lub konkurencyjne z (jednojęzycznymi) najnowocześniejszymi. Osiągamy to dzięki zastosowaniu wielojęzycznych koderów, takich jak XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) oraz wykorzystaniu wielojęzycznych danych szkoleniowych. LOME jest dostępny jako kontener Docker w Docker Hub. Ponadto lekka wersja systemu jest dostępna jako demo internetowe.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm LOME, un sistem de extragere a informațiilor multilingve. Având în vedere un document text ca intrare, sistemul nostru de bază identifică intervale de entități textuale și mențiuni de evenimente cu un parser FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998). Acesta efectuează ulterior rezoluția coreferenței, tipizarea entităților cu granule fine și predicția relației temporale între evenimente. Astfel, sistemul construiește un grafic de cunoaștere axat pe evenimente și entitate. Mai mult, putem aplica module terțe părți pentru alte tipuri de adnotări, cum ar fi extragerea relațiilor. Modulele noastre de primă parte (multilingve) fie depășesc performanțele sau sunt competitive cu cele mai moderne (monolingve). Realizăm acest lucru prin utilizarea codoarelor multilingve precum XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) și prin utilizarea datelor de instruire multilingve. LOME este disponibil ca container Docker pe Docker Hub. În plus, o versiune ușoară a sistemului este accesibilă ca un demo web.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo LOME, sistem za izvršavanje multijezičkih informacija. S obzirom na tekst dokument kao ulaz, naš jezgra sistem identifikuje prostor tekstualnog entiteta i događaja spominje sa analizatorom FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998). Poslije se održava rezolucija pristojnosti, pisanje finog zrnca entiteta i predviđanje vremenskih odnosa između događaja. Tako je sistem izgradio događaj i entitet fokusiran grafik znanja. Možemo dodatno primjenjivati module treće strane za druge vrste annotacije, poput izvlačenja odnosa. Naši (multijezički) prvi grupni moduli ili iznenađuju ili su konkurentni sa (monojezičkim) stanjem umjetnosti. To postižemo kroz korištenje multijezičkih kodera poput XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) i upotrebu podataka o multijezičkoj obuci. LOME je dostupan kao kontejner Docker na Docker Hub. Osim toga, lagana verzija sistema je dostupna kao web demo.', 'si': 'අපි LOME වෙනුවෙන්, බොහොම භාෂාවක් තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න පද්ධතියක්. පාළ බතාව ඇතුළත් විදිහට දෙන්න, අපේ මූල පද්ධතියේ පාළ බතාවක් සහ අවස්ථාවක් කිරීමේ ස්පැන්ස් සඳහා ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියේ  ඒක පස්සේ කෝරෙෆෙරෙන්ස් රිසෝල්යුමන්, සිද්ධ විශ්වාසය ලිපින්, සහ අවස්ථාවක් සම්බන්ධය අතර අතර අත ඒක කරන්න, පද්ධතිය සිද්ධියක් සිද්ධා කරනවා සිද්ධියක් සහ පද්ධතියක් දැනගන්න දැනගන්න. අපිට තව තුන්වෙනි පාර්ටි මොඩියෝල් අනිත් වර්ගයක් වෙනුවෙන්, සම්බන්ධතාවක් නිර්මාණය වගේ. අපේ මුලින්ම පාර්ටි මොඩියුල් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැත්නම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැත්නම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැත්නම් (එක භාෂාවක් අපි මේක ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020යි) වගේ විශේෂ භාෂාවක් කෝඩාර් වලින් භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වගේ. LOME ඩොකර් හැබ් වල ඩොකර් කැන්ටර් වලින් පුළුවන්. ඒ වගේම, පද්ධතියේ සැලකුණු සංවිධානයක් වෙබ් ප්\u200dරදර්ශනයක් විදිහට පිළිගන්න පුළුවන', 'no': 'Vi presenterer LOME, eit system for å utføra ekstraksjon av fleirspråk informasjon. Gjennomsiktig eit tekstdokument som inndata, kjernesystemet vår identifiserer mellomrom av tekst- entitet og hendingar som mener framnett (Baker et al., 1998). Det utfører følgjande oppløysing av koreferansen, skriving av fyrke einingar og tidlegare forhåndsvising mellom hendingar. Ved å gjera det, konstruerer systemet eit hendingar og entitet fokusert kjennende graf. Vi kan bruka fleire modular for tredjeparti for andre typar notasjon, slik som utpakking av relasjonar. Våre (fleirspråk) første partimodular anten utfører eller er konkurrente med den (monospråkste) kunstheten. Vi oppnår dette gjennom bruk av fleirspråkskodarar som XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) og leverer fleirspråksopplæringsdata. LOME er tilgjengeleg som ein Docker- container på Docker Hub. I tillegg er ein lett versjon av systemet tilgjengeleg som nettdemo.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo wadaynaa LOME, nidaam u sameynta soo bixinta macluumaadka luuqadaha kala duduwan. Sida uu helo warqad qoraal ah sida input, nidaamkayaga kooxa ah wuxuu aqoonsadaa dhamaanka qoraalka iyo dhacdooyinka lagu xusto FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998) Parser. Markaas waxaa dib loo sameeyaa go’aanka ku saabsan, qoraalka macluumaadka si fiican loo qoro, iyo wixii ku saabsan wakhti ku meelgaar ah oo dhacdooyinka u dhexeeya. Sida darteed nidaamka ayaa sameynaya dhacdooyin iyo sawir aqoonta ku focus. Sidoo kale waxaan u codsan karaa noocyo kale oo dhibaato ah, tusaale ahaan bixinta xiriirka. Noocyada kooxaha ugu horeeya ee luuqadaha luuqadaha kala duduwan ama waxay ku khilaafsan yihiin xaalada farshaxanka. Waxan ayaannu ku gaadhnaa isticmaalka kooxaha luuqadaha kala duduwan sida XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) iyo soo dirnaa macluumaadka waxbarashada luuqadaha kala duduwan. LOME waxaa looga helaa sida qoraal qalabka Docker Hub. Sidoo kale waxaa lagu isticmaali karaa warqad fudud ee nidaamka sida demo internetka.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar LOME, ett system för flerspråkig informationsutvinning. Med ett textdokument som indata identifierar vårt kärnsystem omfång av textentiteter och händelseomnämnanden med en FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998) parser. Den utför därefter coreferencelopplösning, finkornig entitetstypning och tidsmässiga relationsförutsägelser mellan händelser. Genom att göra det konstruerar systemet en händelse- och entitetsfokuserad kunskapsgraf. Vi kan även använda tredjepartsmoduler för andra typer av anteckningar, som relationsextraktion. Våra (flerspråkiga) förstapartsmoduler presterar antingen bättre eller är konkurrenskraftiga med (enspråkiga) state-of-the-art. Vi uppnår detta genom att använda flerspråkiga kodare som XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) och utnyttja flerspråkiga utbildningsdata. LOME finns som en Docker container på Docker Hub. Dessutom är en lätt version av systemet tillgänglig som en webbdemo.', 'ta': 'நாம் LOME, பல மொழி தகவல் வெளியீட்டை செய்ய ஒரு அமைப்பை காண்பிக்கிறோம். Given a text document as input, our core system identifies spans of textual entity and event mentions with a FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998) parser.  பின்னர் அது குறிப்பிட்ட தெளிவுத்திறன், நன்றாக்கப்பட்ட பொருள் உள்ளிடுகிறது, மற்றும் நிகழ்வுகளுக்கிடையில் தற்கா இதைச் செய்தால், கணினி ஒரு நிகழ்வை உருவாக்குகிறது மற்றும் உண்மையில் கவனமான அறிவு வரைபடம். நாம் மூன்றாம் கட்சி கூறுகளை மற்ற வகைகளுக்கு பயன்படுத்த முடியும், உறவு பெறுதல் போன்ற. நம்முடைய மொழிமொழிகளின் முதல் கட்சி கூறு XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) போன்ற பல மொழி குறியீடுகளை பயன்படுத்தி இதை நாம் பெறுகிறோம் மற்றும் பல மொழி பயிற்சி தரவை அனுப்புகிறோம். LOME கிடைக்கும் டாக்கர் ஹாபில் ஒரு டாக்கர் கொள்கலனாக இருக்கிறது. கூடுதலாக, முறைமையின் எளிமையான வெளியீடு இணைய வடிவமைப்பாக அணுகலாம்.', 'ur': 'ہم LOME کو ایک سیسٹم پیش کریں جو بہت سی زبان معلومات اخراج کرنے کے لئے ہے۔ ایک ٹیکسٹ ڈکومکینٹ کو اینپیٹ بنایا گیا ہے، ہماری کور سیسٹم ایک ٹیکسٹ اینٹیٹ اور ایمنٹ کے مطابق ایک فرم نیٹ (Baker et al., 1998) ٹیکسٹر کے مطابق مطابق کرتا ہے. اس کے بعد مہربانی رخصت کرتا ہے، مہربانی انٹنی ٹائیپینگ، اور موقتی رخصت کی پیش بینی کرتا ہے. اس طرح، سیسٹم نے ایک حادثہ اور انٹیٹی کو علم گراف بنایا ہے۔ ہم تیسرے پارٹی موڈیلوں کو دوسرے نوٹیشن کی طرح کے لئے لازم کرسکتے ہیں، جیسے نسبت اخراج کی طرح. ہماری پہلی زبان کی مدیولوں یا ایک زبان کی حیات کے ساتھ مسابقه ہیں ہم اسے XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) کے مطابق بہت سی زبان کوڈر کے استعمال کے ذریعہ پہنچا رہے ہیں اور بہت سی زبان کی آموزش دادہ کے ذریعہ۔ LOME Docker Hub پر ڈاکر کنٹیر کے طور پر موجود ہے. اس کے علاوہ، سیسٹم کی ایک ہلکا ویرجون ویب دیمو کے طور پر دسترسی حاصل کرنے والا ہے.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw LOME, sistema għat-twettiq ta’ estrazzjoni ta’ informazzjoni multilingwi. Given a text document as input, our core system identifies spans of textual entity and event mentions with a FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998) parser.  It subsequently performs coreference resolution, fine-grained entity typing, and temporal relation prediction between events.  Billi tagħmel dan, is-sistema tibni grafika tal-għarfien iffukata fuq avveniment u entità. We can further apply third-party modules for other types of annotation, like relation extraction.  Our (multilingual) first-party modules either outperform or are competitive with the (monolingual) state-of-the-art.  We achieve this through the use of multilingual encoders like XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) and leveraging multilingual training data.  LOME is available as a Docker container on Docker Hub.  Barra minn hekk, verżjoni ħafifa tas-sistema hija a ċċessibbli bħala demostrazzjoni fuq l-internet.', 'uz': "Biz ko'plab til ma'lumot chiqarishni bajarish uchun LOME'ni hozir qilamiz. Comment Name Bu amalni bajarish orqali tizim bir hodisa va obʼekt foydalanadigan maʼlumot grafikni yaratadi. Biz yana uchinchi qismi modullarini boshqa bir turlarga tajriba qilamiz, huddi munosabatlarni ajratish mumkin. Bizning birinchi xil birinchi birinchi xil modullarimiz shunday ishlab chiqarishimiz yoki o'zimiz (monolingual) shaxsiy sohasi bilan ishlab chiqarishimiz mumkin. Biz buni XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) kabi tilda ko'pchilik kodlash qoidalaridan foydalanishmiz va bir necha tildagi taʼminlovchi maʼlumot yozib olish mumkin. Name Qoʻshimcha, tizimning qisqa versiyasi veb- demo sifatida ishlatiladi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu LOME, một hệ thống để thực hiện việc trích xuất thông tin đa dạng. Với một tài liệu văn bản là tài liệu nhập, hệ thống lõi xác định chi tiết của thực thể văn bản và các sự kiện đề cập đến với một phân tích của the khungNet (Baker et al., 1990). Sau đó, thực hiện giải quyết khả năng cao, đánh chữ liệt nguồn, và dự đoán mối quan hệ thời gian giữa các sự kiện. Do đó, hệ thống chế tạo ra một đồ thị kiến thức tập trung sự kiện và thực thể. Chúng ta có thể áp dụng các mô- đun bên ngoài cho các loại ghi chú khác, như kiểu cách tách ra tương quan. Những mô- đun của chúng ta (đa dạng- kháp) bên nguyên hoặc hoàn thiện hơn hoặc đang cạnh tranh với trạng thái hiện đại. Chúng ta đạt được điều này nhờ có các bộ mã hóa đa dạng như XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) và nhờ kích hoạt dữ liệu đào tạo đa dạng. LOME có thể dùng làm container Neo ở Docker Hub. Thêm vào đó, một phiên bản nhẹ của hệ thống có thể truy cập vào dạng hủy diệt web.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer LOME, et system til udførelse af flersproget informationsudvinding. Givet et tekstdokument som input, vores kernesystem identificerer spænder af tekstenhed og begivenhedsnævnelser med en FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998) fortolker. Det udfører efterfølgende coreferenceopløsning, finkornet entitetstypning og tidsforudsigelse mellem begivenheder. Ved at gøre dette konstruerer systemet en begivenheds- og entitetsfokuseret vidensgraf. Vi kan yderligere anvende tredjepartsmoduler til andre typer annoteringer, såsom relation ekstraktion. Vores (flersprogede) førstepartsmoduler overgår enten eller er konkurrencedygtige med (ensprogede) state-of-the-art. Vi opnår dette ved at bruge flersprogede kodere som XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) og udnytte flersprogede træningsdata. LOME er tilgængelig som en Docker container på Docker Hub. Derudover er en letvægtsversion af systemet tilgængelig som en web demo.', 'nl': 'We presenteren LOME, een systeem voor het uitvoeren van meertalige informatie extractie. Met een tekstdocument als invoer identificeert ons kernsysteem spans van tekstuele entiteiten en gebeurtenisvermeldingen met een FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998) parser. Vervolgens voert het coreferentieresolutie uit, fijnkorrelig entiteittypen en voorspelling van de temporele relatie tussen gebeurtenissen. Zo bouwt het systeem een event- en entiteitsgerichte kennisgrafiek op. We kunnen modules van derden verder toepassen voor andere soorten annotatie, zoals relatieonderzoek. Onze (meertalige) first party modules presteren beter dan of zijn concurrerend met de (eentalige) state-of-the-art. Dit bereiken we door gebruik te maken van meertalige encoders zoals XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) en meertalige trainingsdata. LOME is beschikbaar als Docker container op Docker Hub. Daarnaast is een lichtgewicht versie van het systeem toegankelijk als webdemo.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo LOME, sustav za izvršavanje multijezičkih izvlačenja informacija. S obzirom na tekstski dokument kao ulaz, naš osnovni sustav identificira mjesta tekstualnog entiteta i događaja spominje s analizatorom FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998). Poslije se održava rješenje dobrodošlosti, pisanje zgruženih entiteta i predviđanje vremenskih odnosa između događaja. Tako, sustav konstruira događaj i entitet usredotočen na znanje. Možemo se dodatno primjenjivati moduli treće strane za druge vrste annotacije, poput izvlačenja odnosa. Naši (multijezički) prvi grupni moduli ili iznenađuju ili su konkurentni sa (monojezičkim) stanjem umjetnosti. To postižemo kroz korištenje multijezičkih kodera poput XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) i primjenu podataka o multijezičkoj obuci. LOME je dostupan kao kontejner Docker na Docker Hub. Osim toga, lagana verzija sustava je dostupna kao web demo.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren LOME, ein System zur mehrsprachigen Informationsextraktion. Wenn ein Textdokument als Eingabe verwendet wird, identifiziert unser Kernsystem Spannen von textuellen Entitäten und Ereigniserwähnungen mit einem FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998) Parser. Anschließend führt es die Coreferenzauflösung, feinkörnige Entity-Typisierung und zeitliche Beziehungsvorhersage zwischen Ereignissen durch. Auf diese Weise konstruiert das System einen ereignis- und entitätsorientierten Wissensgraphen. Wir können auch Drittanbieter-Module für andere Arten von Annotation verwenden, wie zum Beispiel Beziehungsextraktion. Unsere (mehrsprachigen) First-Party-Module übertreffen oder sind wettbewerbsfähig mit dem (einsprachigen) Stand der Technik. Dies erreichen wir durch den Einsatz mehrsprachiger Encoder wie XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) und die Nutzung mehrsprachiger Trainingsdaten. LOME ist als Docker Container auf Docker Hub verfügbar. Darüber hinaus ist eine leichtgewichtige Version des Systems als Webdemo verfügbar.', 'bg': 'Представяме система за извличане на многоезична информация. Предвид текстов документ като вход, нашата основна система идентифицира диапазони от текстови единици и споменавания на събития с парсор FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998). Впоследствие той извършва резолюция на кореференцията, фино-зърнесто типиране на обекти и прогнозиране на времевите взаимоотношения между събитията. По този начин системата изгражда графика на знанието, фокусирана върху събитието и същността. Можем допълнително да прилагаме модули на трети страни за други видове анотация, като извличане на релации. Нашите (многоезични) модули от първа страна или надминават, или са конкурентни с (едноезичните) най-съвременните. Ние постигаме това чрез използването на многоезични кодери като и използване на многоезични данни за обучение. LOME се предлага като контейнер на Докер хъб. В допълнение, лека версия на системата е достъпна като уеб демо.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan LOME, sistem untuk melakukan ekstraksi informasi berbagai bahasa. Dengan memberikan dokumen teks sebagai input, sistem inti kami mengidentifikasi jangkauan entitas teks dan peristiwa menyebutkan dengan parser FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998). Kemudian melaksanakan resolusi koreferensi, mengetik entitas yang berkulit gandum, dan prediksi hubungan sementara antara peristiwa. Dengan melakukan itu, sistem membangun grafik pengetahuan yang fokus peristiwa dan entitas. Kita bisa menerapkan modul pihak ketiga untuk jenis anotasi lain, seperti ekstraksi hubungan. Our (multilingual) first-party modules either outperform or are competitive with the (monolingual) state-of-the-art.  Kami mencapai ini melalui penggunaan koder multibahasa seperti XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) dan menggunakan data latihan multibahasa. LOME tersedia sebagai kontainer Docker di Docker Hub. Selain itu, versi ringan dari sistem tersedia dapat diakses sebagai demo web.', 'sw': 'Tunawasilisha LOME, mfumo wa kutengeneza maelezo ya lugha mbalimbali. Kwa kutumia nyaraka ya maandishi kama input, mfumo wetu wa msingi unaonyesha maeneo ya vifaa vya maandishi na matukio yanayotajwa na Mtandao wa FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998) mchambuzi. Baadae inafanya jukumu la msingi, vyombo vizuri vinavyoandikwa vizuri, na utabiri wa mahusiano ya muda kati ya matukio. Kwa kufanya hivyo, mfumo unaunda tukio na vitu vinavyolenga picha ya maarifa. Tunaweza kutumia vifaa vya vyama vya tatu kwa aina nyingine za uchunguzi, kama vile utoaji wa mahusiano. Vyombo vyetu vya vyama vya kwanza vya lugha vinginevyo vinaweza kufanya kazi au kushindana na hali ya sanaa. Tunapata hili kupitia matumizi ya lugha mbalimbali kama vile XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) na kutuma taarifa za mafunzo ya lugha mbalimbali. LOME inapatikana kama mtangazaji wa Docker Hub. Kwa nyongeza, toleo la uzito la mfumo unapatikana kama demo ya mtandaoni.', 'ko': '다중 언어 정보 추출을 수행하는 데 사용되는 LOME 시스템을 소개합니다.텍스트 문서를 입력으로 지정하고 핵심 시스템은 FrameNet(Baker et al., 1998) 해석기를 사용하여 텍스트 엔티티와 이벤트가 언급한 범위를 식별합니다.그것은 이어서 공지 해석, 세립도 실체 유형과 사건 간의 시간 관계 예측을 집행한다.이렇게 함으로써 시스템은 사건과 실체를 중심으로 하는 지식도를 구축했다.우리는 제3자 모듈을 다른 유형의 주석, 예를 들어 관계 추출에 응용할 수 있다.우리의 (다언어) 제1자 모듈은 훌륭하게 표현하거나 가장 선진적인 모듈과 경쟁한다.우리는 XLM-R 등 다국어 인코더(Conneau 등, 2020년)와 다국어 교육 데이터를 활용해 이를 실현했다.LOME은 Docker Hub의 Docker 컨테이너로 제공됩니다.이 시스템의 경량급 버전은 웹 프레젠테이션을 통해 접근할 수 있다.', 'tr': "Biz çoklu dilli maglumatlary a çmak üçin bir sistemi LOME'y görkeýäris. Metin senedi girdi ýaly görkezilýän bolsa, biziň esasy sistemimiz metin bir taýýarlaryny we bellenenler FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998) täzeleçisi bilen tanaýarlar. Sonradan ol ýerleri taýýarlyk çözgütlerni, gaty taýýarlyk we geçici baglaýyşyň arasynda geçirmek üçin üýtgedýär. Bu şekilde sistema bir öýtgeşik we bir zat bilim grafisini gurýar. Biz üçünji bölüm modüllerini başga türler täblisa, baglaýyşyň gaýşartmak ýaly başga modüller üçin uygulap bileris. Biziň (köp dilli) ilkinji oturylyşyk modüllerimiz ýöne çykyp barýar ýada sungatyň durumyny bilen döwletlidirler. Muny XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) ýaly ködleme ködlemeleriniň ulanyp ýetip bilýäris we birnäçe dilli eğitim maglumatyny ulanyp bilýäris. LOME Doktor Hubda Doktor Käpleri hökmünde bar. Munuň üçin sistemiň azalyk wersiýasy web demo ýaly elýeterli bar.", 'fa': 'ما LOME را نشان می دهیم، یک سیستم برای انتقال اطلاعات زیادی زبان. با توجه به یک سند متن به عنوان ورودی، سیستم اصلی ما اسپانیایی از عنوان متن و اتفاق با یک جداکنده FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998) شناسایی می\u200cکند. بعدش تأثیر تأثیر تأثیر و تأثیر ارتباط موقتی بین اتفاقات انجام می\u200cدهد. با انجام این کار، سیستم یک گراف دانش را تمرکز می\u200cکند. ما می توانیم مدول های سوم حزب را برای نوع دیگری از نویسندگی، مثل اخراج ارتباط استفاده کنیم. مدول\u200cهای اولین حزب\u200cهای ما یا بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهند یا با وضعیت هنر رقابت می\u200cکنند. ما این را از طریق استفاده از رمزگارهای زیادی زبان مانند XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) و تأثیر داده های آموزش زیادی زبان می\u200cرسانیم. LOME به عنوان یک کنترل دکتر در دکتر هاب موجود است. علاوه بر این، یک نسخه سنگین سیستم به عنوان نمایش وب دسترسی دارد.', 'am': "የሎሜን ብዙዎችን የቋንቋ መረጃዎችን ለመፈለግ ስርዓት እናቀርባለን፡፡ የጽሑፍ ሰነድ እንደ input ሲሰጥ፣ የሆኑን ስርዓታችን የጽሑፍ አካባቢ እና የሁኔታ አካባቢ እና የፍሬሜኔት (በኬከር et al., 1998) ተሳታፊ ነው። በኋላም የፍትወት ውጤት፣ ጥሩ አካባቢ ጽሑፍ እና በሁኔታ መካከል የጊዜው ግንኙነት መታሰቢያ ይሠራል፡፡ By doing so, the system constructs an event and entity focused knowledge graph.  የሦስተኛ ፓርቲ ሞኮሎችን እንደ ግንኙነት ውጤት ለመጠቀም እንችላለን፡፡ የብዙልዩ ቋንቋዎች የፊተኛይቱ ፓርቲ አካባቢዎች ወይም በሙሉ ቋንቋ (ሞሎልቋል) ሀገሪቱ አዋቂዎች ናቸው፡፡ እንደXLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) እና ብዙዎችን የቋንቋ-ቋንቋዎች ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም እናደርጋለን፡፡ ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s በተጨማሪም የሲስተም ዋንጫ እንደ ገጽ አዲስ መግጠሚያ ነው፡፡", 'sq': 'We present LOME, a system for performing multilingual information extraction.  Duke dhënë një dokument teksti si hyrje, sistemi ynë thelbësor identifikon fushat e njësisë tekstuale dhe ngjarjes përmend me një analizues FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998). It subsequently performs coreference resolution, fine-grained entity typing, and temporal relation prediction between events.  Duke e bërë këtë, sistemi ndërton një grafik të njohurive të përqëndruar në ngjarje dhe njësi. Mund të aplikojmë më tej module të partisë së tretë për lloje të tjera anotacioni, si ekstrahimi i marrëdhënieve. Modulet tona të partisë së parë (shumëgjuhës) ose janë më të larta ose konkurruese me (monogjuhës) state-of-the-art. Ne e arrijmë këtë nëpërmjet përdorimit të koduesve shumëgjuhësorë si XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) dhe përdorimit të të dhënave të treinimit shumëgjuhësor. LOME është në dispozicion si një kontejner Docker në Docker Hub. Përveç kësaj, një version i lehtë i sistemit është i pranueshëm si një demo web.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք LOMe-ը, մի համակարգ, որը օգտագործում է բազլեզու ինֆորմացիայի ստանալը: Տեքստի փաստաթղթին որպես ներմուծք, մեր հիմնական համակարգը բացահայտում է տեքստային առանձնահատկությունների և իրադարձությունների մեջբերումների տարածքները Այն հետագայում կատարում է կորֆերենսի լուծումները, նրբագեղ էության տպագրությունը և ժամանակական հարաբերությունների կանխատեսումը իրադարձությունների միջև: Այդպես անելով, համակարգը կառուցում է իրադարձությունների և էության ֆոկուսացված գիտելիքների գրաֆիկ: Մենք կարող ենք նաև օգտագործել երրորդ մասի մոդուլներ այլ տեսակի նոտացիաների համար, ինչպիսիք են հարաբերությունների դուրս բերումը: Մեր (բազլեզու) առաջին կողմի մոդուլները կամ ավելի լավ են աշխատում, կամ մրցակցում են (միալեզու) տեխնոլոգիայի հետ: Մենք դա հասնում ենք օգտագործելով XLM-R (Conneu et al., 2020) և օգտագործելով բազլեզու ուսումնասիրության տվյալները: LOme-ը հասանելի է Dock-ի անոթ Dock-ի վրա: In addition, a lightweight version of the system is accessible as a web demo.', 'af': "Ons stel LOME voor te stel, 'n stelsel vir uitvoer multilinglike inligting uitvoer. As 'n teksdokument as invoer gegee word, ons kern stelsel identifiseer spans van tekstuele entiteit en gebeurtenis met 'n FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998) ontwerker. Dit uitvoer volgende koreferensie oplossing, fyn-graad entiteit-tiping en tydelike verwanting voorskou tussen gebeurtenis. Deur dit te doen, konstrukteer die stelsel 'n gebeurtenis en entiteit fokuseerde kennis graf. Ons kan verder toewend van derde party modules vir ander tipes annotasie, soos verwanting uitpakking. Ons (multilingual) eerste party modules of uitvoer of is rekenaar met die (monolingual) staat van die kuns. Ons het dit bereik deur die gebruik van multitaalske koders soos XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) en die verplig van multitaalske onderwerp data. LOME is beskikbaar as 'n Docker container op Docker Hub. In addition, a light weight version of the system is accessible as a web demo.", 'az': "Biz çoxlu dil məlumatları çıxartmaq üçün LOME sistemini göstəririk. Bir mətn dökümünü giriş kimi götürüb, mətn sistemimiz bir FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998) ayırıcısı ilə yazılmış textual entity və olaraq tərzlərini tanıyır. Sonradan, bu mərhəmət çözünürlüyünü, təmizlənmiş bir entitə yazmağı və olaraq arasındakı müddətli əlaqələr təşkil edir. Bunu edərək sistem bir olaraq və məlumat grafisini inşa edir. Biz üçüncü parti modullarını başqa nöqtələr üçün istifadə edə bilərik, əlaqələr çıxartması kimi. Bizim ilk dəstə modullarımız ya səviyyətli, ya da mübahisə edirlər. Biz bunu XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) kimi çoxlu dil kodlayıcıların istifadəsindən və çoxlu dil təhsil məlumatlarının istifadəsindən başarırıq. LOME Docker Hub'da Docker kontejneri olaraq faydalanır. Əksinə, sistemin yüngül bir versiyası web demo kimi faydalanır.", 'bn': 'আমরা লোমেকে উপস্থাপন করছি, যা বহুভাষায় তথ্য বের করার একটি সিস্টেম। একটি টেক্সট নথি ইনপুট হিসেবে দেখা যায়, আমাদের মূল সিস্টেম একটি ফ্রেমেনেট (বেকারেট আল., ১৯৯৮) প্যারেজারের সাথে টেক্সচুয়াল পরবর্তীতে সংশোধনীর সিদ্ধান্ত, সুনির্দিষ্ট সাধারণ বস্তু টাইপ করা এবং ঘটনার মধ্যে সাময়িক সম্পর্কের ভবিষ্যৎবাণী প্রদর এই কাজের মাধ্যমে সিস্টেম একটি অনুষ্ঠান এবং বস্তুর দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিত জ্ঞান গ্রাফ তৈরি করে। আমরা আরো তৃতীয় পার্টির মডিউল প্রয়োগ করতে পারি অন্য ধরনের বিরক্তির জন্য, যেমন সম্পর্ক বের করার মত। Our (multilingual) first-party modules either outperform or are competitive with the (monolingual) state-of-the-art.  আমরা এটা অর্জন করি এক্সএলএম-আর (কোনিয়ু et al., ২০২০০) ব্যবহারের মাধ্যমে এবং বহুভাষাভাষী প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য প্রদান করি। ডকার হাবে ডকার কন্টার হিসেবে LOME পাওয়া যাচ্ছে। এছাড়াও, সিস্টেমের একটি হাল্কা উইটভার সংস্করণ ওয়েব ডেমো হিসেবে প্রবেশ করা যাচ্ছে।', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo LOME, sistem za izvršavanje multijezičkih izvlačenja informacija. S obzirom na tekstski dokument kao ulaz, naš jezgra sistem identificira prostor tekstualnog entiteta i događaja spominje s analizatorom FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998). Poslije se održava rješenje pristojnosti, pisanje finog zrnca entiteta i predviđanje vremenskih odnosa između događaja. Tako, sistem izgradi događaj i entitet fokusiran grafik znanja. Možemo dodatno primjenjivati treće strane module za druge vrste annotacije, poput izvlačenja odnosa. Naši (multijezički) moduli prve strane ili iznenađuju ili su konkurentni sa (monojezičkim) stanjem umjetnosti. To postižemo kroz korištenje multijezičkih kodera poput XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) i primjenu podataka o multijezičkoj obuci. LOME je dostupan kao kontejner Docker na Docker Hub. Osim toga, lagana verzija sistema je dostupna kao web demo.', 'ca': "Presentam LOME, un sistema per a fer extracció multilingüe d'informació. Dat un document de text com entrada, el nostre sistema central identifica espais d'entitat textual i mencions d'eventos amb un analitzador FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998). Després fa la resolució de coreferència, la tipulació d'entitats fins i la predicció de relació temporal entre els esdeveniments. Fent això, el sistema construeix un gràfic de coneixement centrat en esdeveniments i entitats. Podem aplicar móduls tercers per altres tipus d'anotació, com l'extracció de relacions. Els nostres móduls de primera banda (multilingües) superen o són competitius amb l'avançat (monolingüe). Això ho aconsegueixem amb l'ús de codificadors multilingües com XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) i aprofitant dades de formació multilingüe. LOME is available as a Docker container on Docker Hub.  A més, una versió lleugera del sistema és accesible com a demostració web.", 'cs': 'Představujeme LOME, systém pro provádění vícejazyčné extrakce informací. Vzhledem k textovému dokumentu jako vstupu, náš hlavní systém identifikuje rozpětí textových entit a zmínek událostí pomocí FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998) parser. Následně provádí rozlišení koreference, jemné typování entit a predikci časového vztahu mezi událostmi. Tím systém vytvoří graf znalostí zaměřený na události a entity. Dále můžeme aplikovat moduly třetích stran pro další typy anotace, jako je extrakce vztahů. Naše (vícejazyčné) moduly první strany buď překonávají, nebo jsou konkurenceschopné (jednojjazyčné) nejmodernější. Toho dosahujeme použitím vícejazyčných snímačů, jako je XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020), a využitím vícejazyčných školicích dat. LOME je k dispozici jako kontejner Docker na Docker Hub. Kromě toho je lehká verze systému přístupná jako webová demo.', 'et': 'Tutvustame LOME-i, mitmekeelse informatsiooni väljavõtmise süsteemi. Arvestades tekstidokumenti sisendina, tuvastab meie põhisüsteem tekstilise olemi ja sündmuste märkimise ulatused FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998) parseriga. Seejärel teostab ta kordferentsi lahenduse, peeneteraalse olemi tüüpimise ja sündmuste ajalise seose prognoosimise. Seda tehes ehitab süsteem sündmustele ja olemile keskendunud teadmiste graafiku. Võime rakendada kolmandate osapoolte mooduleid muud tüüpi annotatsioonide jaoks, näiteks seoste ekstraheerimiseks. Meie (mitmekeelsed) esimese osapoole moodulid kas ületavad või konkureerivad (ühekeelsed) state-of-the-art. Me saavutame selle mitmekeelsete kodeerijate, nagu XLM-R (Conneau jt., 2020) kasutamise ja mitmekeelsete koolitusandmete kasutamise kaudu. LOME on saadaval Dockeri konteinerina Docker Hubis. Lisaks on süsteemi kerge versioon kättesaadav veebidemona.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme LOME-järjestelmän monikielisen tiedonhankinnan suorittamiseen. Koska tekstidokumentti syötteenä, ydinjärjestelmämme tunnistaa tekstientiteetin ja tapahtumamainintojen alueet FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998) -jäsentäjällä. Sen jälkeen se suorittaa koreferenssin resoluution, hienorakeisen entiteettityypin ja tapahtumien välisen ajallisen suhteen ennustamisen. Näin järjestelmä rakentaa tapahtuma- ja entiteettikeskeisen tietokaavion. Voimme myös soveltaa kolmannen osapuolen moduuleja muunlaisiin huomautuksiin, kuten relaation uuttamiseen. Meidän (monikieliset) ensimmäisen osapuolen moduulit joko suoriutuvat tai kilpailevat (yksikielisten) huippuluokan kanssa. Saavutamme tämän käyttämällä monikielisiä koodereita, kuten XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020), ja hyödyntämällä monikielistä koulutustietoa. LOME on saatavilla Docker-konttina Docker Hubissa. Lisäksi järjestelmän kevyt versio on käytettävissä web demona.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo vam LOME, sistem za izvajanje večjezičnega pridobivanja informacij. Glede na besedilni dokument kot vhod, naš osrednji sistem identificira razpone besedilnih entitet in omemb dogodkov z razčlenjevalnikom FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998). Nato izvede ločljivost koreference, natančno tipkanje entitet in napoved časovne relacije med dogodki. S tem sistem gradi graf znanja, usmerjen v dogodek in entiteto. Nadalje lahko uporabimo module tretjih oseb za druge vrste opombe, kot je ekstrakcija relacij. Naši (večjezični) moduli prve proizvajalce bodisi presegajo ali so konkurenčni z (enojezičnimi) najsodobnejšimi. To dosežemo z uporabo večjezičnih kodirnikov, kot je XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020), in izkoriščanjem večjezičnih podatkov o usposabljanju. LOME je na voljo kot vsebnik Docker v Docker Hub. Poleg tega je lahka različica sistema dostopna kot web demo.', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da LoME, wata na'urar da ke samun zaɓen bayan takardar mulki. Given a text document as input, our core system identifies spans of textual entity and event mentions with a FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998) parser.  Haƙĩƙa, ta yi aiki da fassarar mafarin aiki, rubutun abun mai kyau da kuma babu wani abu na haɗi a tsakanin ayuka. Ga ka aikata haka, na'ura yana samun wani alama da abun da aka zura cikin fassaran ilmi. Kana iya ƙarami da shirin ƙungiyoyi na uku don wasu nau'i na cũtarwa, kamar fitarwa da mazaɓa. Ga'ananmu na farkon-birnin turuya ko kuma sai ka yi gauraya da halin-sanar. Tuna kamfata wannan da ke amfani da kodi masu cikin mulki-lingui kamar XLM-R (Conneeu et al., 2020) kuma ke sambawa da data na tsarin multilingri. An iya samar da LEME kamar wata cikin shirin Dokumentar Hub. Da wannan, ana iya haɗi wani version mai sauƙi na'urar na'ura kamar wata shawarar kwamfyuta.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nambah LOME, sistem kanggo nggawe akeh informasi luwih lenggal view-padding-color text-box-mode Ngawe iku, sistem kuwi nggawe akèh dumatenno karo "Enti" sing bisa gepekaké awak barang. Anyone Awak dhéwé (akeh luwih-luwih) modul sing sampek iso nggawe ngubah apat karo perusahaan lan sampek kuwi tanggal terakhi. Awak dhéwé iso nglanggar nggambar sistem kanggo koder multilengu, kaya XLM-R (conne et al, 2020) lan nggawe data yang bantuan nggawe barang langgar. LOME wis dipoleh barêng docker nang docker hub. Nambah, versi sing paling dong nêt ning sistem iki dadi sing arep berusahaan lagi web-dego.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים את LOME, מערכת לבצע חיפוש מידע רב-שפתי. בהתחשב במסמך טקסט כתוצאה, מערכת הליבה שלנו מזהה חלקים של ישות טקסטלית ואירוע מזכירים עם מעבד FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998). לאחר מכן, הוא מבצע פיתוח התאמה, טיפוס יחסים מוצקים, וחזוי מערכת יחסים זמנית בין אירועים. By doing so, the system constructs an event and entity focused knowledge graph.  אנחנו יכולים להפעיל עוד מודולים של חלק שלישי לסוגים אחרים של ציונים, כמו חיתוך יחסים. המודולים הראשונים שלנו (רבות שפתיים) או יוצאים מעל או מתחרים עם המצב (מונושפתי) החדש. אנו משיגים את זה באמצעות השימוש במקודים רבים שפותיים כמו XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) ומשתמשים במידע אימונים רבים שפותיים. LOME זמין כמיכל Docker על Docker Hub. בנוסף, גרסה קלה של המערכת נגישה כדמו אינטרנט.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་དབྱིབས་འཕར་རིས་ཀྱི་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཞིག་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Given a text document as input, our core system identifies spans of textual entity and event mentions with a FrameNet (Baker et al., 1998) parser. དེའི་རྗེས་ཀྱིས་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་དབྱེ་བ་དང་། དེ་ལས་མ་ལག་གིས་བྱ་འགུལ་དང་དབུལ་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་དུས་ཚོར་འབྲེལ་བ་གཞན་དང་མི་འདྲ་བའི་རྣམ་པ་གཞན་དང་མཉམ་དུ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ་དེ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རེད། ང་ཚོའི་སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་འདི་XLM-R (Conneau et al., 2020) ཡིས་སྐད་ཀྱི་ཕྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་Koder(Conneau et al., 2020) གཉིས་ཀྱི་སྤྱོད་ནས་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད། LOME སྒྲིག་ཆ་མཚམས་ཁང་ཐོག་མའི་Docker དུས་ཚན་བཟོ་ཚར་བ མ་ལག་གི་ཐོན་རིམ་ཞིག་ཀྱང་དུ་འཇུག་སྤྱོད་རུང་བའི་བྱ་རིམ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས།'}
{'en': 'Graph Matching and Graph Rewriting : GREW tools for corpus exploration, maintenance and conversion', 'ar': 'مطابقة الرسم البياني وإعادة كتابة الرسم البياني: أدوات GREW لاستكشاف الجسم وصيانته وتحويله', 'fr': "Graph Matching and Graph Rewriting\xa0: outils GREW pour l'exploration, la maintenance et la conversion de corpus", 'es': 'Coincidencia de gráficos y reescritura de gráficos: herramientas GREW para la exploración, el mantenimiento y la conversión de corpus', 'pt': 'Graph Matching e Graph Rewriting: ferramentas GREW para exploração, manutenção e conversão de corpus', 'zh': '图形配重写:语料库索转换 GROW 具', 'ja': 'グラフマッチングとグラフ書き換え：コーパス探索、メンテナンス、変換のための成長したツール', 'hi': 'ग्राफ़ मिलान और ग्राफ़ पुनर्लेखन: कॉर्पस अन्वेषण, रखरखाव और रूपांतरण के लिए GROW उपकरण', 'ru': 'Graph Matching and Graph Rewriting: инструменты Growed для исследования, обслуживания и преобразования корпусов', 'ga': 'Meaitseáil Grafa agus Athscríobh Grafa: Uirlisí GREW chun corpais a thaiscéaladh, a chothabháil agus a chomhshó', 'ka': 'გრაფიკის შესაბამისი და გრაფიკის გადაწერა: GREW ხელსაწყობილობა corpus exploration, maintenance and conversion', 'el': 'Ταίριασμα γραφήματος και Επαναγραφή γραφήματος: εργαλεία για εξερεύνηση, συντήρηση και μετατροπή σωμάτων', 'hu': 'Graf Matching és Graf átírás: GREW eszközök a korpusz feltárásához, karbantartásához és konvertálásához', 'it': "Graph Matching e Graph Rewriting: strumenti GREW per l'esplorazione, la manutenzione e la conversione dei corpi", 'kk': 'Графикалық сәйкестік және графикалық қайта жазу: Корпус зерттеу, сақтау және аудару құралы GREW', 'mk': 'Графско совпаѓање и презапишување: GREW алатки за експлоатација, одржување и конверзија на корпусот', 'lt': 'Graph Matching and Graph Rewriting: GREW tools for corpus exploration, maintenance and conversion', 'ms': 'Graph Matching and Graph Rewriting: GREW tools for corpus exploration, maintenance and conversion', 'ml': 'ഗ്രാഫ് പൊരുത്തുന്നതും ഗ്രാഫ് വീണ്ടും എഴുതുന്നതും കോര്\u200dപ്പ് പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള GREW ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d', 'pl': 'Dopasowywanie wykresów i przepisywanie wykresów: narzędzia GREW do eksploracji, konserwacji i konwersji korpusów', 'no': 'Grafikk som passar og omskriv på grafen: GREW- verktøy for corpus exploration, maintenance and conversion', 'ro': 'Potrivirea graficului și rescrierea graficului: instrumente GREW pentru explorarea, întreținerea și conversia corpurilor', 'sr': 'Prepisanje grafika: GREW alata za istraživanje korpusa, održavanje i konvertaciju', 'si': 'Graph Matching and Graph Rewrite: GREW Tools for Corpus Explosion, Maintence and Conversation', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha iyo qorista graf: GREW qalabka baaritaanka qoyska', 'mt': 'Graph Matching and Graph Rewriting: GREW tools for corpus exploration, maintenance and conversion', 'mn': 'График холбоотой болон график дахин бичих: Корпус судалгаа, хадгалах болон шилжүүлэх хэрэгсэл GREW', 'sv': 'Grafmatchning och grafomskrivning: GREW verktyg för utforskning, underhåll och konvertering av korpuser', 'ta': 'வரைப்படம் பொருத்தம் மற்றும் வரைப்படம் மீண்டும் எழுதுதல்: கோர்ப்ஸ் கண்டறிதல், பராமரிப்பு மற்றும் மாற்றுதலுக', 'ur': 'Graph Matching and Graph Rewriting: GREW tools for corpus exploration, maintenance and conversion', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thay đổi đồ thị: máy phát triển, bảo trì và chuyển đổi.', 'da': 'Grafmatchning og grafomskrivning: GREW værktøjer til udforskning, vedligeholdelse og konvertering af korpus', 'bg': 'Съвпадение на графики и пренаписване на графики: инструменти за проучване, поддръжка и конвертиране на корпуси', 'nl': 'Grafiek Matching en Grafiek herschrijven: GREW tools voor corpusverkenning, onderhoud en conversie', 'hr': 'Prepisanje grafa i prepisanje grafa: GREW alata za istraživanje korpusa, održavanje i preobraćanje korpusa', 'id': 'Graph Matching and Graph Rewriting: GREW tools for corpus exploration, maintenance and conversion', 'sw': 'Vifaa vya GREW kwa ajili ya uchunguzi, kuhamasisha na kubadilisha mafanikio', 'fa': 'نوشتن گراف هماهنگ و گراف: ابزار GREW برای کشف کورپوس، نگهبانی و تبدیل', 'de': 'Graph Matching und Graph Rewriting: GREW Tools für Korpus Exploration, Wartung und Konvertierung', 'ko': '그림 일치와 그림 재작성: 자료 라이브러리 탐색, 유지보수, 변환에 사용되는 도구', 'af': 'Graaf ooreenstemmende en graaf herskryf: GREW nutsprogramme vir corpus explorasie, onderhouering en omskakeling', 'tr': 'Grafik Eýeleşen we Grafik ýene ýazmak: corpus explorasy, meýdança we üýtgetmek üçin GREW esbaplar', 'sq': 'Përkatësia e grafikut dhe ripërshkrimi i grafikut: mjete GREW për eksplorimin, mbajtjen dhe konversimin e korpusit', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Գրաֆի համապատասխանությունը և գրաֆի վերագրումը. Կորպուսի ուսումնասիրության, պահպանության և վերափոխման GRW գործիքներ', 'bn': 'গ্রাফ মিচিং এবং গ্রাফ পুনরায় লিখছে: কোর্পাস গবেষণা, রক্ষা এবং পরিবর্তনের জন্য GREW টুল', 'az': 'Grafik ńįŇül…ônir v…ô Grafik Yenid…ôn YazńĪlńĪr: corpus exploration, maintenance and conversion tools for GREW', 'bs': 'Prepisanje grafika i prepisanje grafa: GREW alata za istraživanje korpusa, održavanje i preobraćanje korpusa', 'ca': 'Compatibilitat Gràfic i Reescriptura Gràfic: eines GREW per a explorar, mantenir i convertir corpus', 'fi': 'Graafin täsmäytys ja kaavioiden uudelleenkirjoittaminen: GREW työkalut korpusten tutkimiseen, ylläpitoon ja muuntamiseen', 'et': 'Graafikute sobitamine ja graafikute ümberkirjutamine: GREW tööriistad korpuse uurimiseks, hooldamiseks ja teisendamiseks', 'cs': 'Graf Matching a přepisování grafů: GREW nástroje pro průzkum korpusů, údržbu a konverzi', 'he': 'Graph Matching and Graph Rewriting: GREW tools for corpus exploration, maintenance and conversion', 'sk': 'Ujemanje grafikov in preoblikovanje grafikov: GREW orodja za raziskovanje, vzdrževanje in pretvorbo korpusa', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Graph Matching and Graph Rewriting: GREW tools for corpus exploration, maintenance and conversion', 'jv': 'Graph Match and Graph Rewriting: COMPLETED tools for bodus'}
{'en': 'This article presents a set of tools built around the Graph Rewriting computational framework which can be used to compute complex rule-based transformations on linguistic structures. Application of the graph matching mechanism for corpus exploration, error mining or quantitative typology are also given.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه المقالة مجموعة من الأدوات المبنية حول إطار العمل الحسابي لإعادة كتابة الرسم البياني والذي يمكن استخدامه لحساب التحويلات المعقدة القائمة على القواعد على الهياكل اللغوية. يتم أيضًا تقديم تطبيق آلية مطابقة الرسم البياني لاستكشاف الجسم أو التنقيب عن الأخطاء أو التصنيف الكمي.', 'fr': "Cet article présente un ensemble d'outils construits autour du framework de calcul Graph Rewriting qui peuvent être utilisés pour calculer des transformations complexes basées sur des règles sur des structures linguistiques. L'application du mécanisme de correspondance graphique pour l'exploration de corpus, l'exploration d'erreurs ou la typologie quantitative est également présentée.", 'es': 'Este artículo presenta un conjunto de herramientas creadas en torno al marco computacional de reescritura de gráficos que se pueden utilizar para calcular transformaciones complejas basadas en reglas en estructuras lingüísticas. También se proporciona la aplicación del mecanismo de comparación de gráficos para la exploración de corpus, la minería de errores o la tipología cuantitativa.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta um conjunto de ferramentas construídas em torno do framework computacional Graph Rewriting que podem ser usadas para computar transformações complexas baseadas em regras em estruturas linguísticas. A aplicação do mecanismo de correspondência de gráficos para exploração de corpus, mineração de erros ou tipologia quantitativa também é fornecida.', 'ja': 'この記事では、言語構造上の複雑なルールベースの変換を計算するために使用できるグラフ書き換え計算フレームワークを中心に構築された一連のツールを紹介します。コーパス探索、エラーマイニング、または定量的類型化のためのグラフマッチングメカニズムの応用も説明した。', 'ru': 'В этой статье представлен набор инструментов, построенных на основе вычислительной структуры Graph Rewriting, которая может быть использована для вычисления сложных преобразований на основе правил на лингвистических структурах. Приведены также примеры применения механизма сопоставления графиков для исследования корпусов, определения ошибок или количественной типологии.', 'zh': '本文引群 Graph Rewriting 计框架构之具,可于计言结构上法转换。 又给图匹配机制于语料库探索、误掘定量类型学中应用。', 'hi': 'यह लेख ग्राफ़ पुनर्लेखन कम्प्यूटेशनल ढांचे के चारों ओर निर्मित उपकरणों का एक सेट प्रस्तुत करता है जिसका उपयोग भाषाई संरचनाओं पर जटिल नियम-आधारित परिवर्तनों की गणना करने के लिए किया जा सकता है। कॉर्पस अन्वेषण, त्रुटि खनन या मात्रात्मक टाइपोलॉजी के लिए ग्राफ मिलान तंत्र का अनुप्रयोग भी दिया गया है।', 'ga': 'Cuireann an t-alt seo i láthair sraith uirlisí a tógadh timpeall ar an gcreat ríomhaireachtúil Athscríobh Grafa ar féidir a úsáid chun claochluithe casta bunaithe ar rialacha ar struchtúir theangeolaíocha a ríomh. Tugtar freisin feidhm na meicníochta meaitseála graf maidir le taiscéalaíocht corpais, mianadóireacht earráide nó tíopeolaíocht chainníochtúil.', 'ka': 'ეს საქაღალდე ახალგაზრდება რამდენიმე ხელსაწყობილობი, რომელიც ინგუფისტიკური სტრუქტურაციების შესაძლებლობად გამოყენებული კომპლექტურაციის შესაძლებლობად გამო შეცდომის მიმდინარების მაგალითი მექანიზმის გამოყენება, შეცდომის მიმდინარების ან კოლუტატიური ტიპოლოგიის გამოყენება.', 'hu': 'Ez a cikk a grafikai 첬jra챠r찼s sz찼m챠t찼si keretrendszer k철r챕 챕p체l흷 eszk철z철ket mutatja be, amelyek seg챠ts챕g챕vel komplex szab찼lyalap첬 찼talak챠t찼sokat lehet kisz찼m챠tani a nyelvi strukt첬r찼kon. A gr찼f megfelel흷 mechanizmus alkalmaz찼sa korpuszkutat찼sra, hibab찼ny찼szatra vagy kvantitat챠v tipol처gi찼ra is megtal찼lhat처.', 'el': 'Αυτό το άρθρο παρουσιάζει ένα σύνολο εργαλείων χτισμένων γύρω από το υπολογιστικό πλαίσιο Αναγραφής Γραφημάτων που μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν για τον υπολογισμό σύνθετων μετασχηματισμών βασισμένων σε κανόνες σε γλωσσικές δομές. Δίνεται επίσης η εφαρμογή του μηχανισμού αντιστοίχισης γραφήματος για την εξερεύνηση σωμάτων, την εξόρυξη σφαλμάτων ή την ποσοτική τυπολογία.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta una serie di strumenti costruiti intorno al framework computazionale Graph Rewriting che possono essere utilizzati per calcolare complesse trasformazioni basate su regole su strutture linguistiche. Viene inoltre fornita l'applicazione del meccanismo di corrispondenza dei grafici per l'esplorazione del corpus, l'estrazione di errori o la tipologia quantitativa.", 'lt': 'Šiame straipsnyje pateikiamas priemonių rinkinys, sukurtas aplink grafiko perrašymo skaičiavimo sistemą, kuris gali būti naudojamas sudėtingiems taisyklėmis grindžiamiems kalbinių struktūrų pokyčiams apskaičiuoti. Taip pat taikomas grafiko atitikties mechanizmas, skirtas korpuso žvalgymui, klaidų gavybai arba kiekybinei tipologijai.', 'kk': 'Бұл мақала лингвистикалық құрылғылар үшін комплекс ережелерді есептеу үшін графикалық қайта жазу қоршауындағы құралдар жиынын көрсетеді. Корпус зерттеулері, қате бағыттау не санаттық тифология үшін график сәйкестік механизмінің қолданбасы келтіріледі.', 'mk': 'Оваа статија претставува набор алатки изградени околу компјутерската рамка за презапишување на графикот, која може да се користи за пресметка на комплексни трансформации базирани на правила на јазичните структури. Исто така се дадени апликации на механизмот за одговарање на графот за експлоатација на корпус, рудање грешки или квантитативна типологија.', 'ms': 'Artikel ini menghasilkan set alat yang dibina disekitar kerangka komputasi Tulis Semula Graf yang boleh digunakan untuk mengira perubahan kompleks berdasarkan peraturan pada struktur bahasa. Aplikasi mekanisme yang sepadan graf untuk eksplorasi corpus, penambahan ralat atau tipologi kuantitatif juga diberi.', 'ml': 'ഈ ലേഖനം ഗ്രാഫിന്റെ പുനരിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. കണക്ടിനുള്ള ഫ്രെയിമെക Application of the graph matching mechanism for corpus exploration, error mining or quantitative typology are also given.', 'mt': 'Dan l-artikolu jippreżenta sett ta’ għodod mibnija madwar il-qafas komputattiv tar-Rikitba tal-Grafika li jistgħu jintużaw biex jiġu kkalkulati trasformazzjonijiet kumplessi bbażati fuq ir-regoli fuq strutturi lingwistiċi. L-applikazzjoni tal-mekkaniżmu ta’ tqabbil tal-grafika għall-esplorazzjoni tal-corpus, għall-minjieri tal-iżbalji jew għat-tipoloġija kwantitattiva tingħata wkoll.', 'mn': 'Энэ баримтууд хэлний бүтээгдэхүүний комплекс дүрсийн үндсэн өөрчлөлтийг тооцоолох боломжтой График дахин бичиж чадах хэрэгсэл бүрдүүлдэг. Корпус судалгааны, алдаа хөрөнгө оруулах, эсвэл тоон хэмжээний хэлбэрийн график холбоотой механизмийн хэрэглээ өгсөн.', 'no': 'Denne artikkelen viser eit sett verktøy bygd rundt grafikkomskrivingsrammeverket som kan brukast til å rekna ut komplekse regelsbaserte transformasjonar på lingviske strukturar. Det er også gitt programmet til grafen som passar med mekanismen for corpus exploration, feilmining eller kvantitative typologi.', 'ro': 'Acest articol prezintă un set de instrumente construite în jurul cadrului computațional de rescriere a graficului, care pot fi utilizate pentru a calcula transformări complexe bazate pe reguli pe structuri lingvistice. Se oferă, de asemenea, aplicarea mecanismului de corelare a graficului pentru explorarea corpurilor, extragerea erorilor sau tipologia cantitativă.', 'sr': 'Ovaj članak predstavlja gomilu alata izgrađenih oko računalnog okvira Grafa koji se može iskoristiti za računalo kompleksnih transformacija na pravilima na jezičkim strukturama. Prijavljeno je i mehanizam odgovarajućeg grafika za istraživanje korpusa, rudarstvo grešaka ili kvantitativnu tipologiju.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono zestaw narzędzi zbudowanych wokół struktury obliczeniowej Graph Rewriting, które mogą być wykorzystane do obliczania złożonych transformacji opartych na regułach na strukturach językowych. Podano również zastosowanie mechanizmu dopasowania wykresów do eksploracji korpusów, eksploracji błędów lub typologii ilościowej.', 'si': 'මේ ලේඛනය පෙන්වන්නේ ග්\u200dරාෆ් ආපහු ලියපු පරිගණනය ක්\u200dරියාම්ප්\u200dරේම්ටර් වලට නිර්මාණය කරපු උපකරණ සූදානයක් තියෙනව කෝර්පස් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ග්\u200dරාෆ් එක්කම් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ග්\u200dරාෆ් එක්කම් පරීක්ෂණය, ප්\u200dරතිශාල විද', 'so': 'Maktabadan wuxuu soo bandhigaa qalabka lagu dhisay oo ku wareegsan qoraalka xisaabta, kaas oo loo isticmaali karo in lagu xisaabo beddelashooyin ku saabsan qoraalka complex ah oo ku qoran dhismaha luuqadaha. Waxaa sidoo kale la bixiyaa codsiga kaarka oo u eg qaababka baaritaanka korpuska, jarashada khaladda ama qiyaasta.', 'ta': 'இந்த கட்டுரை வரைகலை மறுபடியும் எழுதும் கணக்கீட்டு சட்டத்தை சுற்றி உருவாக்கிய கருவிகளை கொடுக்கும் சிக்கலான விதிமாற்றங்களை கணக்கி கோர்ப்ஸ் கண்டுபிடிப்பு, பிழை குறைந்து அல்லது குறைந்த வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கான வரைப்படத்தை பொருத்தும் முறைமையை பயன', 'sv': 'Den här artikeln presenterar en uppsättning verktyg byggda kring beräkningsramen Graph Rewriting som kan användas för att beräkna komplexa regelbaserade transformationer på språkliga strukturer. Tillämpning av grafmatchningsmekanismen för korpusutforskning, felbrytning eller kvantitativ typologi ges också.', 'ur': 'یہ لکھا ایک مجموعہ ہے جو گراف کے گرد کمپیوٹریشن فرمیک کے لئے بنائے گئے ہیں جو زبان کی ساختاروں پر پیچیدہ قانون کی بنیادی تغییرات کا شمار کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے۔ قارپوس تحقیقات کے لئے گراف کے مطابق مکانیسم کا کاروبار بھی دیا گیا ہے، خطا منڈی یا منطقی تایپولوژی بھی۔', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis Name', 'vi': 'Bài viết này cung cấp một số công cụ được xây dựng quanh bộ phận tính to án Graph Rewriting, which can be used to tính toán phức tạp phục hưng dựa trên ngôn ngữ. Được cung cấp phương pháp khớp đồ thị cho việc thăm dò, khai thác lỗi hay quy mô số.', 'bg': 'Тази статия представя набор от инструменти, изградени около изчислителната рамка за пренаписване на графики, които могат да бъдат използвани за изчисляване на сложни, базирани на правила трансформации върху лингвистични структури. Посочено е и прилагането на механизма за съвпадение на графики за проучване на корпуси, извличане на грешки или количествена типология.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer et sæt værktøjer bygget omkring Graph Rewriting beregningsrammen, som kan bruges til at beregne komplekse regelbaserede transformationer på sproglige strukturer. Anvendelse af grafmatchningsmekanismen til korpusforskning, fejlmining eller kvantitativ typologi gives også.', 'hr': 'Ovaj članak predstavlja skup alata izgrađenih oko računalnog okvira Grafa koji se može koristiti za računalo kompleksnih transformacija na temelju pravila na jezičkim strukturama. Prijavljeno je i mehanizam odgovarajućeg grafika za istraživanje korpusa, rudarstvo greška ili kvantitativnu tipologiju.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert een reeks tools gebouwd rond het computationele framework Graph Rewriting dat kan worden gebruikt om complexe op regels gebaseerde transformaties op linguïstische structuren te berekenen. Toepassing van het graph matching mechanisme voor corpus exploratie, error mining of kwantitatieve typologie wordt ook gegeven.', 'id': 'Artikel ini mempersembahkan set alat yang dibangun disekitar Graph Rewrite komputasi kerangka yang dapat digunakan untuk menghitung transformasi kompleks berdasarkan aturan pada struktur bahasa. Aplikasi dari mekanisme yang cocok grafik untuk eksplorasi corpus, pengembara kesalahan atau tipologi kuantitatif juga diberikan.', 'de': 'Dieser Artikel stellt eine Reihe von Werkzeugen vor, die auf dem Graph Rewriting Computational Framework basieren und verwendet werden können, um komplexe regelbasierte Transformationen auf linguistischen Strukturen zu berechnen. Die Anwendung des Graph Matching Mechanismus für Korpusexploration, Error Mining oder quantitative Typologie wird ebenfalls gegeben.', 'ko': '본고는 그림 재작성 계산 프레임워크를 둘러싼 도구를 소개했는데 언어 구조를 바탕으로 하는 복잡한 규칙 전환을 계산하는 데 사용할 수 있다.본고는 도형 일치 메커니즘이 어료 라이브러리 탐색, 오류 발굴 또는 정량 유형학에서의 응용도 소개했다.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inaonyesha seti ya zana zilizojengwa kote za Mfumo wa Hesabu wa Graph ambao unaweza kutumika kuhesabu mabadiliko yanayotokana na utawala mkali katika miundombinu ya lugha. Utumiaji wa mchoro unaofanana na mfumo wa uchunguzi wa makampuni, uchunguzi wa makosa au utamaduni wa kiasi kikubwa pia unapewa.', 'tr': 'Bu makala lingwistiki strukturalarda karmaşık düzgün üýtgewleri hasaplamak üçin ullanylýan grafikler töwereginde inşa edilen eserler görkezýär. Korpus gezek üçin gabdalyk meýdançasynyň uygulamasy, hata tapylmaky ýa quantitat tipologiýasy hem berilýär.', 'fa': 'این مقاله یک مجموعه از ابزارهای ساخته شده در اطراف چهارچوب کامپیوتری گراف که می تواند برای محاسبه تغییرات قانون بر اساس قانون پیچیده بر ساختارهای زبان استفاده شود. استفاده از مکانیزم متفاوت گراف برای کشف کورپوس، خروج خطا یا نوع گوناگونی نیز داده می شود.', 'sq': 'Ky artikull paraqet një sërë mjete të ndërtuara rreth kuadrit kompjuterik të Rishkrimit të Grafit që mund të përdoren për të llogaritur transformime komplekse bazuar në rregulla në strukturat gjuhësore. U jepet gjithashtu aplikimi i mekanizmit të përputhjes së grafikut për eksplorimin e corpus, gabimet në minierë apo tipologjinë kuantitative.', 'am': 'ይህ ጽሑፍ በቋንቋው አካባቢ ላይ የተደረገውን የሥርዓት ለውጦች ለመቆጠር የሚችል የውጤት ሥርዓት-based ለውጦችን ለመቆጣጠር የሚችል የሥርዓት መሠረት ማቀናቀል ያስታያል፡፡ Application of the graph matching mechanism for corpus exploration, error mining or quantitative typology are also given.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է մի շարք գործիքներ, որոնք կառուցված են Գրաֆի վերագրման հաշվարկների շրջանակում, որոնք կարող են օգտագործվել լեզվական կառուցվածքների բարդ կանոններով հիմնված վերափոխությունների հաշվարկելու համար: Գրաֆիկի համապատասխանման մեխանիզմի կիրառումը մարմնի ուսումնասիրության, ձախողումների հանման կամ քանակական տիպոլոգիայի համար նույնպես տրվում է:', 'bn': 'এই প্রবন্ধটি গ্রাফ পুনরায় নির্মাণ করা একটি সেট টুল উপস্থাপন করেছে যা ভাষাগত কাঠামোর উপর জটিল নিয়ম ভিত্তিক পরিবর্তন গণনা করতে পারে। কোর্পাস গবেষণা, ত্রুটি কমিনিং অথবা পরিমাণ টাইপোলিজির জন্য গ্রাফ মিলিয়ে যাওয়া মেকেনিস্টেমের অ্যাপলিকেশন দেয়া হয়', 'ca': "Aquest article presenta un conjunt d'eines construïdes al voltant del marc computacional Graph Rewrite que es pot utilitzar per calcular transformacions complexes basades en regles en estructures lingüístices. També s'aplica el mecanisme d'ajustament del gràfic per a l'exploració de corpus, la mineria d'errors o la tipologia quantitativa.", 'bs': 'Ovaj članak predstavlja skup alata izgrađenih oko računalnog okvira Grafa koji se može koristiti za računalo kompleksnih transformacija na pravilima na jezičkim strukturama. Prijavljeno je i mehanizam odgovarajućeg grafika za istraživanje korpusa, rudarstvo grešaka ili kvantitativnu tipologiju.', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje sadu nástrojů postavených na výpočetním rámci Graph Rewriting, které lze použít k výpočtu komplexních pravidel založených transformací na jazykových strukturách. Dále jsou uvedeny aplikace mechanismu porovnávání grafů pro průzkum korpusů, dolování chyb nebo kvantitativní typologii.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis esitatakse graafikute ümberkirjutamise arvutusraamistiku ümber ehitatud tööriistade kogum, mida saab kasutada keeleliste struktuuride keerukate reeglipõhiste muunduste arvutamiseks. Lisaks on esitatud graafikute sobitamise mehhanismi rakendamine korpuse uurimiseks, veakaevandamiseks või kvantitatiivseks tüpoloogiaks.', 'af': "Hierdie artikel stel 'n stel van nutsprogramme gebou rondom die Graf Herskryf rekenaar raamwerk wat kan gebruik word om kompleks reël-gebaseerde transformasies op lingvisse strukture te bereken. Toepassing van die graaf ooreenstemmende mekanisme vir korpus uitvoer, fout mining of kvantitatiewe tipologie is ook gegee.", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään Graafin uudelleenkirjoittamisen laskennallisen viitekehyksen ympärille rakennettuja työkaluja, joita voidaan käyttää monimutkaisten sääntöpohjaisten muunnoksien laskemiseen kielirakenteissa. Lisäksi esitetään graafien täsmäytysmekanismin soveltaminen korpusetsintään, virheiden louhintaan tai kvantitatiiviseen typologiaan.', 'az': 'Bu məktub, dil qurularında kompleks qayda-tabanlı dəyişiklikləri hesablamaq üçün istifadə edilə bilən Grafik yeni yazılmış bilgisayar çerçevesini göstərir. corpus exploration, error mining, or quantitative typology also given to the graph matching mechanism for the corpus exploration.', 'sk': 'Ta članek predstavlja nabor orodij, zgrajenih okoli računalniškega okvira za preoblikovanje grafičnih grafov, ki se lahko uporabljajo za izračun kompleksnih pravil temelječih transformacij na jezikovnih strukturah. Navedena je tudi uporaba mehanizma za ujemanje grafov za raziskovanje korpusov, iskanje napak ali kvantitativno tipologijo.', 'ha': "Wannan makala na ƙunsa da wasu kayan aiki wanda aka gina a tsakanin rubutun rubutun na Grafi, wanda za'a iya yi amfani da shi dõmin a ƙidãya canza shidalori masu bincike na rubutun murakkab kan tsarin linguistic. Ana motsa shirin grafyuta mai daidaita wa jarraba nau'in rubutu, ƙarami da ɓarna ko kuma tsari.", 'he': 'המאמר הזה מציג קבוצה של כלים בנויים סביב המסגרת מחדשת הכתיבה של הגרף שיכולה להשתמש כדי לחשב שינויים מורכבים מבוססים על חוקים על מבנים שפתיים. נותנים גם שימוש של מנגנון התאמת הגרף לחקירה של קורפוס, חיפוש שגיאות או טיפולוגיה כמונית.', 'jv': 'Artik iki mudheng akeh akeh alat sing nggawe ning arep Graph Rewriting kompatistik dadi iki iso nggunakake tarjamahan sing sampek bantuan nggawe barang kelangan Aplikasi kanggo ngilanggar mekanipun kanggo tukang mrograf.', 'bo': 'This article presents a set of tools built around the Graph Rewriting computational framework which can be used to compute complex rule-based transformations on linguistic structures. མཐུན་སྣེ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་དང་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་བྱ་རིམ་དང་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་སྤྱོད་ཀྱང་།'}
{'en': 'Massive Choice, Ample Tasks (MaChAmp): A Toolkit for Multi-task Learning in NLP', 'ar': 'اختيار هائل ، مهام وافرة (MaChAmp): مجموعة أدوات للتعلم متعدد المهام في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية', 'pt': 'Escolha massiva, tarefas amplas (MaChAmp): um kit de ferramentas para aprendizado multitarefa em PNL', 'fr': "Massive Choice, Ample Tasks (MacHamp)\xa0: une boîte à outils pour l'apprentissage multitâche en NLP", 'es': 'Elección masiva, tareas amplias (MacHamp): un conjunto de herramientas para el aprendizaje multitarea en PNL', 'ja': 'Massive Choice, Ample Tasks （ MaChAmp ） ： NLPにおけるマルチタスク学習のためのツールキット', 'hi': 'बड़े पैमाने पर विकल्प, पर्याप्त कार्य (MaChAmp): NLP में बहु-कार्य सीखने के लिए एक टूलकिट', 'zh': '海量择足任(MaChAmp):施于NLP多任务学之工具包', 'ru': 'Massive Choice, Ample Tasks (MaChAmp): Набор инструментов для многозадачного обучения в NLP', 'ga': 'Rogha Ollmhór, Tascanna Leapa (MaChAmp): Foireann Uirlisí d’Fhoghlaim Ilthasc in NLP', 'hu': 'Masszív választás, bőséges feladatok (MaChAmp): Eszközkészlet a többfeladatos tanuláshoz NLP-ben', 'ka': 'მასიური მონიშვნა, ამოლური დავალება (MaChAmp): NLP- ში მრავალური დასწავლების ხელსაწყო', 'it': "Massive Choice, Ampie Tasks (MaChAmp): un kit di strumenti per l'apprendimento multi-task in PNL", 'kk': 'Массикалық таңдау, тапсырмалар (MaChAmp): NLP- де көп тапсырмаларды оқыту құралы панелі', 'lt': 'Daugiaužduočių mokymosi NLP priemonių rinkinys', 'el': 'Τεράστια επιλογή, άφθονες εργασίες (Μια εργαλειοθήκη για την εκμάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών στο ΝΛΠ', 'ms': 'Pilihan Massif, Tugas Ampel (MaChAmp): A Toolkit for Multi-Task Learning in NLP', 'ml': 'വലിയ തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുക, ആമ്പിള്\u200d ടാസ്കുകള്\u200d (മാച്ച് എമ്പ്): NLP-ല്\u200d പല ജോലി പഠിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു പണിയിട', 'mk': 'Massive Choice, Ample Tasks (MaChAmp): Алатка за учење на повеќе задачи во NLP', 'mn': 'Масс сонголт, Ампл Tasks (MaChAmp): NLP-д олон ажлын суралцах хэрэгсэл', 'mt': 'Għażla Massiva, Kompiti Ampli (MaChAmp): Sett ta’ Għodod għat-Tagħlim Multikompiti f’NLP', 'sr': 'Massive izbor, Ample Tasks (MaChAmp): Toolkit za učenje više zadataka u NLP-u', 'ro': 'Alegere masivă, sarcini ample (MaChAmp): un kit de instrumente pentru învățarea multi-sarcini în PNL', 'pl': 'Masywny wybór, duże zadania (MaChAmp): zestaw narzędzi do wielozadaniowego uczenia się w NLP', 'sv': 'Massivt val, omfattande uppgifter (MaChAmp): Ett verktygspaket för multi-task lärande i NLP', 'ta': 'பெரிய தேர்வு, மாம்பெல் பணிகள் (MaChAmp): NLP யில் பல பணிகள் கற்றுக்கான கருவிப்பெட்டி', 'ur': 'ملی انتخاب، امپل ٹاکس (MaChAmp): NLP میں بہت سی ٹاکس سیکھنے کے لئے ایک تولکیٹ', 'no': 'Massiv val, amplingsoppgåver (MaChAmp): Eit verktøykassett for å læra fleire oppgåver i NLP', 'so': 'Doorasho badan, Mas’uul shaqo (MaChAmp): A Toolkit for Multi-task Learning in NLP', 'si': 'ගොඩක් විකල්පය, ඇම්පුල් වැඩක් (MaChAmp): NLP දී ගොඩක් වැඩක් ඉගෙනීම සඳහා උපකරණ කිටු', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tòa cơ hội, Ample Tasks (Mafachp): A Toolkit for multiChạy Chạy learn in Nhất ngôn', 'bg': 'Масивен избор, широки задачи (Комплект инструменти за многофункционално обучение в НЛО', 'hr': 'Masivni izbor, okupljanje zadataka (MaChAmp): Toolkit za učenje više zadataka u NLP-u', 'nl': 'Enorme keuze, ruime taken (MaChAmp): een toolkit voor multitask leren in NLP', 'da': 'Massive Choice, rigelige opgaver (MaChAmp): Et værktøjssæt til multi-opgave læring i NLP', 'id': 'Massive Choice, Ample Tasks (MaChAmp): A Toolkit for Multi-Task Learning in NLP', 'de': 'Massive Choice, Ample Tasks (MaChAmp): Ein Toolkit für Multi-Task Learning in NLP', 'fa': 'انتخاب عمومی، کارهای عمومی (MaChAmp): یک کیت ابزار برای یادگیری زیادی از کار در NLP', 'ko': '대량 선택, 대량 작업(MachAmp): NLP의 다중 작업 학습 키트', 'tr': "A çyk Saýlaw, Ample Tasks (MaChAmp): NLP'da Köp-Taýgyny Öwrenmek üçin Esbap Zolaky", 'sw': 'Uchaguzi mkubwa, Mipango ya Umoja (MaChAmp): Kifaa cha Kufunza kazi nyingi katika NLP', 'sq': 'Zgjedhje masive, Detyra të Amplimit (MaChAmp): Një paketë mjete për Mësimin me shumë detyra në NLP', 'af': "Massiewe Keuse, Ample Opdragte (MaChAmp): ' n Nutsbalk vir Multi- Task Leer in NLP", 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Մազատ ընտրություն, բազմաթիվ առաջադրանքներ (MaChAmp): ՆԼՊ-ում բազմախնդիրներ սովորելու գործիքներ', 'bn': 'ব্যাপক নির্বাচন, অ্যাম্পেল কাজ (ম্যাকএমপ): NLP-এ অনেক কাজ শিক্ষার জন্য একটি টুলিকিট', 'bs': 'Masivni izbor, okupljani zadatak (MaChAmp): Toolkit za učenje više zadataka u NLP-u', 'az': "Y칲ks톛k Se칞im, Ample Tasks (MaChAmp): NLP'd톛 칞ox-task 칬yr톛nm톛k 칲칞칲n bir Alet Kitab캼", 'cs': 'Masivní volba, široké množství úkolů (MaChAmp): sada nástrojů pro víceúkolové učení v NLP', 'ca': "Massive Choice, Ample Tasks (MaChAmp): Un conjunt d'eines per aprendre multitasques a NLP", 'et': 'Massiivne valik, ulatuslikud ülesanded (MaChAmp): tööriistakomplekt mitme ülesandega õppimiseks NLP-is', 'fi': 'Massive Choice, Ample Tasks (MaChAmp): Työkalupaketti monitehtäväoppimiseen NLP:ssä', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'בחירה מסיבית, משימות רבות (MaChAmp): ערכת כלים ללמוד במשימות רבות ב-NLP', 'sk': 'Massive Choice, Ample Tasks (MaChAmp): Orodja za večopravilno učenje v NLP', 'bo': 'Massive Choice, Ample Tasks (MaChAmp)：NLP ནང་གི་སྣ་མང་བོའི་ལག་ཆ་སྟངས', 'jv': 'Global options'}
{'en': 'Transfer learning, particularly approaches that combine multi-task learning with pre-trained contextualized embeddings and fine-tuning, have advanced the field of Natural Language Processing tremendously in recent years. In this paper we present MaChAmp, a toolkit for easy fine-tuning of contextualized embeddings in multi-task settings. The benefits of MaChAmp are its flexible configuration options, and the support of a variety of natural language processing tasks in a uniform toolkit, from text classification and sequence labeling to dependency parsing, masked language modeling, and text generation.', 'pt': 'O aprendizado por transferência, particularmente abordagens que combinam aprendizado multitarefa com embeddings contextualizados pré-treinados e ajustes finos, avançaram tremendamente no campo do Processamento de Linguagem Natural nos últimos anos. Neste artigo, apresentamos o MaChAmp, um kit de ferramentas para fácil ajuste fino de embeddings contextualizados em configurações multitarefa. Os benefícios do MaChAmp são suas opções de configuração flexíveis e o suporte a uma variedade de tarefas de processamento de linguagem natural em um kit de ferramentas uniforme, desde classificação de texto e rotulagem de sequência até análise de dependência, modelagem de linguagem mascarada e geração de texto.', 'fr': "L'apprentissage par transfert, en particulier les approches qui combinent l'apprentissage multitâche avec des intégrations contextualisées pré-entraînées et des ajustements précis, a considérablement fait progresser le domaine du traitement du langage naturel ces dernières années. Dans cet article, nous présentons MacHamp, une boîte à outils permettant de peaufiner facilement les intégrations contextualisées dans des environnements multitâches. Les avantages de MaChamp sont ses options de configuration flexibles et la prise en charge de diverses tâches de traitement du langage naturel dans une boîte à outils uniforme, allant de la classification de texte et de l'étiquetage de séquences à l'analyse des dépendances, à la modélisation de langage masqué et à la génération de texte.", 'ar': 'التعلم عن طريق النقل ، ولا سيما الأساليب التي تجمع بين التعلم متعدد المهام وحفلات الزفاف المصممة مسبقًا والضبط الدقيق ، قد طورت مجال معالجة اللغة الطبيعية بشكل كبير في السنوات الأخيرة. في هذا البحث نقدم MaChAmp ، مجموعة أدوات للضبط الدقيق لحفلات الزفاف السياقية في إعدادات متعددة المهام. تتمثل مزايا MaChAmp في خيارات التكوين المرنة ، ودعم مجموعة متنوعة من مهام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية في مجموعة أدوات موحدة ، من تصنيف النص وتسمية التسلسل إلى تحليل التبعية ، ونمذجة اللغة المقنعة ، وإنشاء النص.', 'es': 'El aprendizaje por transferencia, en particular los enfoques que combinan el aprendizaje multitarea con incrustaciones contextualizadas y ajustes preentrenados, han hecho avanzar enormemente el campo del procesamiento del lenguaje natural en los últimos años. En este artículo presentamos MacHamp, un kit de herramientas para ajustar fácilmente las incrustaciones contextualizadas en entornos multitarea. Los beneficios de MacHamp son sus opciones de configuración flexibles y el soporte de una variedad de tareas de procesamiento del lenguaje natural en un kit de herramientas uniforme, desde la clasificación de textos y el etiquetado de secuencias hasta el análisis de dependencias, el modelado de lenguaje enmascarado y la generación de texto.', 'ja': '転送学習、特にマルチタスク学習と事前に訓練された文脈化された埋め込みと微調整を組み合わせたアプローチは、近年、自然言語処理の分野を大きく進歩させています。本稿では、マルチタスク設定におけるコンテキスト化された埋め込みを簡単に微調整するためのツールキットであるMaChAmpを紹介する。MaChAmpの利点は、柔軟な構成オプションと、テキスト分類とシーケンスラベリングから依存関係解析、マスクされた言語モデリング、テキスト生成まで、統一されたツールキット内のさまざまな自然言語処理タスクをサポートすることです。', 'zh': '迁徙之学,特将多任务学与豫练之上下文嵌微合调之法,近年极推自然语言理领域之渐。 本文,我们将介绍 MaChAmp,这是一个工具包,施于多任务置中轻松微调上下文嵌入。 MaChAmp 之势,在乎配选项,与一工具包之中,扶百自然语言之任,自文本类序,至于倚解析屏蔽,言语建模成。', 'ru': 'Передаточное обучение, особенно подходы, которые сочетают многозадачное обучение с предварительно обученными контекстуализированными вложениями и тонкой настройкой, в последние годы значительно продвинулись в области обработки естественного языка. В этой статье мы представляем MaChAmp, инструментарий для легкой точной настройки контекстуализированных вложений в многозадачных условиях. Преимуществами MaChAmp являются гибкие параметры конфигурации и поддержка множества задач обработки естественного языка в едином наборе инструментов, от классификации текста и маркировки последовательностей до синтаксического анализа зависимостей, моделирования маскированного языка и генерации текста.', 'hi': 'स्थानांतरण सीखने, विशेष रूप से दृष्टिकोण जो पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित प्रासंगिक एम्बेडिंग और ठीक-ट्यूनिंग के साथ बहु-कार्य सीखने को जोड़ते हैं, ने हाल के वर्षों में प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण के क्षेत्र को काफी उन्नत किया है। इस पेपर में हम MaChAmp, बहु-कार्य सेटिंग्स में प्रासंगिक एम्बेडिंग के आसान ठीक-ट्यूनिंग के लिए एक टूलकिट प्रस्तुत करते हैं। MaChAmp के लाभ इसके लचीले विन्यास विकल्प हैं, और एक समान टूलकिट में विभिन्न प्रकार के प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण कार्यों का समर्थन, पाठ वर्गीकरण और अनुक्रम लेबलिंग से लेकर निर्भरता पार्सिंग, नकाबपोश भाषा मॉडलिंग और पाठ पीढ़ी तक।', 'ga': 'Tá an fhoghlaim aistrithe, go háirithe cuir chuige a chomhcheanglaíonn foghlaim ilthasc le leabaithe comhthéacsaithe réamh-oilte agus mionchoigeartú, tar éis dul chun cinn iontach a dhéanamh le blianta beaga anuas ar an réimse Próiseáil Teanga Nádúrtha. Sa pháipéar seo cuirimid MaChAmp i láthair, foireann uirlisí le haghaidh mionchoigeartú éasca a dhéanamh ar leabaithe comhthéacsúla i suímh il-tasc. Is iad na buntáistí a bhaineann le MaChAmp ná a roghanna cumraíochta solúbtha, agus tacaíocht d’éagsúlacht tascanna próiseála teanga nádúrtha i bhfoireann uirlisí aonfhoirmeach, ó aicmiú téacs agus lipéadú seichimh go parsáil spleáchais, samhaltú teanga faoi cheilt, agus giniúint téacs.', 'ka': 'ტრანსტრების სწავლება, განსაკუთრებით მიღებები, რომლებიც მრავალ საქმედების სწავლებას, რომლებიც წინ შემდეგ განსწავლა კონტექსტურალურად შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ კონტექსტურალურად შე ამ დოკუნტში ჩვენ MaChAmp-ს გამოსახულებთ, მრავალ დავალებების შესაძლებელი კონტექსტუალურად დამუშაობისთვის ხელსაწყოთა კონტექსტუალურად დავამუშა MaChAmp-ის გამოსახულებები არის მისი გრაფიკური კონფიგურაციის პარამეტრები, და განსხვავებული სახელსაწყოთა სახელსაწყოთა კონფიგურაციის მუშაობა, ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციის და კონფიგურაციის მართების პარალიზაციის, მა', 'el': 'Η μάθηση μεταφοράς, ιδιαίτερα οι προσεγγίσεις που συνδυάζουν την εκμάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών με προσχεδιασμένες ενσωματώσεις στο πλαίσιο και την τελειοποίηση, έχουν προχωρήσει σημαντικά τον τομέα της επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας τα τελευταία χρόνια. Σε αυτή την εργασία παρουσιάζουμε ένα κιτ εργαλείων για την εύκολη προσαρμογή των ενσωμάτωσης σε ρυθμίσεις πολλαπλών εργασιών. Τα οφέλη του είναι οι ευέλικτες επιλογές διαμόρφωσης του και η υποστήριξη ποικίλων εργασιών επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας σε ένα ενιαίο σύνολο εργαλείων, από την ταξινόμηση κειμένου και τη σήμανση ακολουθίας έως την ανάλυση εξάρτησης, τη μοντελοποίηση μασκαρισμένης γλώσσας και τη δημιουργία κειμένου.', 'hu': 'A transzfertanulás, különösen azok a megközelítések, amelyek ötvözik a többfeladatos tanulást az előre képzett kontextuális beágyazásokkal és finomhangolással, az elmúlt években rendkívül fejlesztették a természetes nyelvfeldolgozás területét. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a MaChAmp eszköztárat, amely a kontextuális beágyazások egyszerű finomhangolását teszi lehetővé többfeladatos beállításokban. A MaChAmp előnyei a rugalmas konfigurációs lehetőségek, valamint a különböző természetes nyelvfeldolgozási feladatok támogatása egységes eszköztárban, a szövegosztályozástól és a szekvencia címkézéstől a függőség elemzéséig, maszkos nyelvmodellezésig és a szöveggenerálásig.', 'it': "L'apprendimento del trasferimento, in particolare gli approcci che combinano l'apprendimento multi-task con incorporazioni contestualizzate pre-addestrate e la messa a punto, hanno avanzato enormemente il campo dell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale negli ultimi anni. In questo articolo presentiamo MaChAmp, un toolkit per una facile messa a punto di incorporazioni contestualizzate in impostazioni multi-task. I vantaggi di MaChAmp sono le sue opzioni di configurazione flessibili e il supporto di una varietà di attività di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale in un toolkit uniforme, dalla classificazione del testo e l'etichettatura della sequenza all'analisi delle dipendenze, alla modellazione del linguaggio mascherato e alla generazione del testo.", 'mk': 'Transfer learning, particularly approaches that combine multi-task learning with pre-trained contextualized embeddings and fine-tuning, have advanced the field of Natural Language Processing tremendously in recent years.  Во оваа хартија ја претставуваме MaChAmp, алатка за лесно прилагодување на контекстуалните вградувања во поставувања со повеќе задачи. Придобивките од MaChAmp се нејзините флексибилни конфигурациски опции, и поддршката на различни природни задачи за обработување јазик во униформен набор алатки, од класификација на текст и етикетирање на секвенца до анализирање на зависноста, маскирано моделирање јазик и гене', 'kk': 'Көп тапсырмаларды білім беру оқиғалары, осылай-ақ бірнеше тапсырмаларды біріктіру және бақылау арқылы, соңғы жылдарда Түзіндік тіл процессорының өрісін көп өзгертілген. Бұл қағазда, бірнеше тапсырма параметрлерінде контекстуалды ендіру үшін оңай құралдарды MaChAmp- ға таңдаймыз. MaChAmp- тың артықшылығы - оның гибсиялық баптау параметрлері және бірнеше құралдар панелінде, мәтін классификациясынан және тәуелсіздік талдау, қалқалаған тілдерді моделу және мәтін құру үшін түрлі тілдерді өзгерт', 'ml': 'പഠനം മാറ്റുക, പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് പല ജോലി പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന് മുമ്പ് പരിശീലനം പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെടുന്നതിനെ കൂട്ടുക മാറ്റുന്ന സ്വാഭാവ ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രവർ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d മാച്ച് ആമ്പിനെ കാണിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ഉപകരണക്കെട്ട് പല-ജോലിയുടെ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d നിര്\u200dബന്ധമാക്കുന്ന മാച്ച് എമ്പിന്റെ ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d അതിന്റെ ഫ്ലാക്സിബിള്\u200d ക്രമീകരണത്തിന്റെ ഐച്ഛികങ്ങളാണ്. ഒരു യൂണിഫോമിലെ ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ജോലികളില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷ പ്', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran pemindahan, terutama pendekatan yang menggabungkan pembelajaran bertugas-bertugas dengan penyelesaian kontekstual yang dilatih-dilatih dan penyesuaian-penyesuaian, telah melanjutkan medan Pemprosesan Bahasa Alami dengan luar biasa dalam tahun-tahun terakhir. Dalam kertas ini kami perkenalkan MaChAmp, alat untuk penyesuaian mudah penyelesaian penyelesaian kontekstual dalam tetapan tugas-berbilang. Keuntungan MaChAmp adalah pilihan konfigurasi fleksibel, dan sokongan pelbagai tugas pemprosesan bahasa semulajadi dalam kumpulan alat seragam, dari klasifikasi teks dan label urutan hingga penghuraian dependensi, pemodelan bahasa bertopeng, dan generasi teks.', 'mt': 'It-tagħlim tat-trasferimenti, b’mod partikolari approċċi li jgħaqqdu t-tagħlim multikompiti ma’ inkorporazzjonijiet kuntestwalizzati mħarrġa minn qabel u rfinar, avvanzaw b’mod enormi l-qasam tal-Proċessar tal-Lingwa Naturali f’dawn l-aħħar snin. F’dan id-dokument nippreżentaw MaChAmp, sett ta’ għodod għall-a ġġustament faċli ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet kuntestwalizzati f’ambjenti b’ħafna kompiti. Il-benefiċċji tal-MaChAmp huma l-għa żliet flessibbli tal-konfigurazzjoni tagħha, u l-appoġġ ta’ varjetà ta’ kompiti naturali ta’ pproċessar tal-lingwi f’sett uniformi ta’ għodod, mill-klassifikazzjoni tat-test u t-tikkettar tas-sekwenza sal-analizzazzjoni tad-dipendenza, l-immudellar tal-lingwi mmaskrati, u l-ġenerazzjoni', 'mn': 'Трансфер суралцах суралцах, ялангуяа олон ажлын суралцах үйл ажиллагааг урьд суралцах болон сайхан зохицуулах арга зам нь сүүлийн жилүүдэд Байгалийн хэл Процессийн талбайг маш их хөгжүүлсэн. Энэ цаасан дээр бид MaChAmp-г олон ажлын төлөвлөгөөнд маш амархан тодорхойлох хэрэгсэл бий болгодог. MaChAmp-ын ашиг нь түүний гишүүн загварын сонголтууд, байгалийн хэл боловсруулах үйл ажиллагааг нэгтгэх хэрэгсэл, текст хэлбэрээс, дарааллаас хамааралтай хуваалцах, хамааралтай хэл загвар, мөн текст бүтээлч хүртэл дэмждэг.', 'no': 'Overføringslæring, spesielt tilnærmingar som kombinerer fleire oppgåver med føretrainerte kontekstualiserte innbygging og finnstilling, har utvikla feltet for naturspråk-prosessering i siste år. I denne papiret viser vi MaChAmp eit verktøykassett for enkelt finnstilling av kontekstualiserte innbygging i fleire oppgåveinnstillingar. Utviklingane av MaChAmp er fleksibele innstillingane for oppsettet, og støtte for ulike naturspråk- handlingar i eit enkelt verktøykassett, frå tekstklassifikasjon og sekvensmerkelapp til tolking av avhengighet, maskerte språk- modellering og tekstgenerering.', 'pl': 'Nauka transferowa, zwłaszcza podejścia łączące wielozadaniowe uczenie się z wstępnie przeszkolonymi kontekstualizowanymi osadzeniami i dostosowywaniem, znacznie zaawansowała obszar przetwarzania języka naturalnego w ostatnich latach. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy MaChAmp, zestaw narzędzi do łatwego dostrajania kontekstowych osadzeń w ustawieniach wielozadaniowych. Zalety MaChAmp to elastyczne opcje konfiguracji oraz obsługa różnych zadań przetwarzania języka naturalnego w jednolitym zestawie narzędzi, od klasyfikacji tekstu i etykietowania sekwencji po parsowanie zależności, modelowanie języka maskowanego i generowanie tekstu.', 'si': 'Transfer learnt, partially approach that combinate Multi-Job learnt with pre-Trained Contextuolized Embdings and Fine-tuning, have progress the field of Native language processing in the latter decades. මේ පත්තරේ අපි MaChAmp වෙනුවෙන්, විශේෂ සැකසුම් වලට පරීක්ෂණ සඳහා සැලසුම් සැකසුම් සඳහා සුදුසු සඳහා උපකරණ කි MaChAmp ගේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය තමයි එයාගේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විකල්පයක්, සහ ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විකල්පයක් සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාව ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා පාළුවේ', 'ro': 'Învățarea transferului, în special abordările care combină învățarea multi-task cu încorporările contextualizate pre-instruite și reglarea fină, au avansat enorm domeniul procesării limbajului natural în ultimii ani. În această lucrare prezentăm MaChAmp, un kit de instrumente pentru reglarea ușoară a încorporărilor contextualizate în setările multi-task. Beneficiile MaChAmp sunt opțiunile sale flexibile de configurare și suportul unei varietăți de sarcini de procesare a limbajului natural într-un set de instrumente uniform, de la clasificarea textului și etichetarea secvențelor până la analizarea dependențelor, modelarea limbajului mascat și generarea de text.', 'so': 'Waxbarashada bedelka, gaar ahaanshaha waxbarashada waxbarashada badan ee la isku xiriira iskuul-horaadka la tababariyey iyo barbaarinta, waxay hormariyeen beerta qaabilaadda afka dabiiciga ee ugu dambeeyey sanado aad u badan. Warqadan waxaan ku qornaa MaChAmp, qalabka caadi ah oo aad u fududaato meelaha la fududeeyo oo lagu sameeyo goobaha shaqaalaha badan. Kaalmada MaChAmp waa doorashooyinkooda caqliga ah, iyo kaalmada shaqaalaha lagu baaraandegayo afka dabiicadda ah oo kala duduwan oo laga helaa qalabka midowga ah, fasaxa qoraalka iyo bandhigyada qoraalka, ku qoran baarshaha ku xiran, tusaale ahaan luuqada maskaxda, iyo farshaha qoraalka.', 'sr': 'Naučenje prijenosa, posebno pristupe koje kombiniraju multizadatačno učenje sa predobučenim kontekstualizacijskim integracijama i finalnim prilagodbama, u poslednjih godina su veoma napredovale polje procesa prirodnog jezika. U ovom papiru predstavljamo MaChAmp, alat za lako ispravljanje kontekstualiziranih integracija u višestrukim nastavama. Prihode MaChAmp a su njegove fleksibilne opcije za konfiguraciju, i podrška raznih prirodnih zadataka za obrađivanje jezika u uniformnom korištenju alata, od tekstske klasifikacije i označavanja etikete do analize zavisnosti, maskiranog jezika i proizvodnje teksta.', 'ta': 'கற்றலை மாற்றுக, குறிப்பாக பல பணிகள் கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் முன் பயிற்சியாக மாற்றப்பட்ட பொருள்கள் மற்றும் நன்றாக மாற்றும், சமீபத்திய ஆண்டுகளில் இயல்பான மொழி செ இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் MaChAmp, ஒரு சுலபமான சரியான தூண்டுதல் கருவி The benefits of MaChAmp are its flexible configuration options, and the support of a variety of natural language processing tasks in a uniform toolkit, from text classification and sequence labeling to dependency parsing, masked language modeling, and text generation.', 'sv': 'Transfer learning, särskilt metoder som kombinerar multi-task lärande med pre-utbildade kontextualiserade inbäddningar och finjustering, har avancerat fältet Natural Language Processing enormt under de senaste åren. I denna uppsats presenterar vi MaChAmp, en verktygslåda för enkel finjustering av kontextuella inbäddningar i multi-task inställningar. Fördelarna med MaChAmp är dess flexibla konfigurationsalternativ och stöd för en mängd olika bearbetningsuppgifter i ett enhetligt verktygspaket, från textklassificering och sekvensmärkning till beroendetolkning, maskerad språkmodellering och textgenerering.', 'ur': 'Transfer learning, particularly approaches that combine multi-task learning with pre-trained contextualized embeddings and fine-tuning, have advanced the field of Natural Language Processing in recent years. ہم نے اس کاغذ میں MaChAmp کو آسان ترکیب کے لئے ایک تولیک کیٹ کے لئے بہت سی کارس امینٹوں میں آسان ترکیب دینے کے لئے پیش کیا ہے. MaChAmp کا فائدہ اس کی مہربانی پیکربندی کے اختیار ہیں، اور ایک جوڑے تولیک کیٹ میں مختلف مختلف طبیعی زبان پردازی کے کاموں کی مدد ہے، ٹیکس کلاسپیٹ سے اور سطح لیبلینگ سے مستقل پارسینگ تک، ماسک کی زبان نمڈلینگ تک، اور ٹیکس نسل تک.', 'lt': 'Perdavimo mokymasis, ypač metodai, derinantys daugiafunkcinį mokymąsi su iš anksto apmokytais kontekstiniais įdiegimais ir patobulinimu, pastaraisiais metais labai pagerino gamtos kalbų apdorojimo sritį. Šiame dokumente pristatome MaChAmp, įrankių rinkinį, skirtą lengvai pritaikyti kontekstinius įdėjimus kelių užduočių nustatymuose. MaChAmp teikia naudą lanksčioms konfigūracijos galimybėms ir remia įvairias gamtinių kalbų apdorojimo užduotis vienodoje įrankių rinkinyje, nuo teksto klasifikavimo ir sekos ženklinimo iki priklausomybės analizavimo, paslėptos kalbos modeliavimo ir teksto kūrimo.', 'uz': "Ko'pchilik o'rganishni o'rganish, bir necha vazifalar o'rganishni o'rganishdan oldin taʼminlov qilingan vazifalar va yaxshi taʼminlovchilar bilan birlashtirish mumkin, yangi yillarda tabiiy tillar jarayonlarini juda katta darajada oshirishni oshirish mumkin. Bu sahifa biz MaChAmp, ko'plab vazifalar moslamalarida o'zgartiriladigan yordamchi yordamchi asboblar. The benefits of MaChAmp are its flexible configuration options, and the support of a variety of natural language processing tasks in a uniform toolkit, from text classification and sequence labeling to dependency parsing, masked language modeling, and text generation.", 'vi': 'Việc học chuyển nhượng, đặc biệt những phương pháp kết hợp nhiều việc học với những trường hợp tình hình được đào tạo trước, đã phát triển mạnh mẽ lĩnh vực sản xuất ngôn ngữ tự nhiên trong những năm gần đây. Trong tờ giấy này chúng tôi giới thiệu Mafast, một bộ dụng cụ để chỉnh sửa dễ dàng sự hình ảnh trong thiết lập đa nhiệm vụ. Những lợi ích của Mafachp là tùy chọn cấu hình linh hoạt của nó, và hỗ trợ một số công việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên trong một bộ công cụ đồng bộ, từ việc phân loại văn bản và hiệu lệnh cho đến phân tách độ phụ thuộc, chế tạo ngôn ngữ đeo mặt nạ, và sản xuất văn bản.', 'bg': 'Трансферното обучение, особено подходите, които съчетават многофункционалното обучение с предварително обучени контекстуализирани вграждания и фина настройка, значително напредват в областта на обработката на естествения език през последните години. В тази статия представяме инструментариум за лесно фино настройване на контекстуализирани вграждания в настройки с много задачи. Предимствата на са гъвкавите опции за конфигуриране и подкрепата на различни задачи за обработка на естествени езици в уникален набор от инструменти, от класификация на текста и етикетиране на последователности до анализиране на зависимости, маскирано езиково моделиране и генериране на текст.', 'da': 'Overførsel af læring, især tilgange, der kombinerer multi-task læring med prætrænede kontekstualiserede indlejringer og finjustering, har avanceret feltet Natural Language Processing enormt i de seneste år. I denne artikel præsenterer vi MaChAmp, et værktøjssæt til nem finjustering af kontekstualiserede indlejringer i multi-opgaveindstillinger. Fordelene ved MaChAmp er dens fleksible konfigurationsmuligheder, og understøttelse af en række naturlige sprogbehandlingsopgaver i et ensartet værktøjssæt, fra tekstklassifikation og sekvensmærkning til afhængighedsparsing, maskeret sprogmodellering og tekstgenerering.', 'hr': 'Naučenje prijenosa, posebno pristupe koje kombiniraju multizadatačno učenje sa predobučenim kontekstualizacijskim integracijama i ispravnim upravljanjem, u posljednjih godina su izuzetno napredovale polje procesa prirodnog jezika. U ovom papiru predstavljamo MaChAmp, alat za lako ispravljanje kontekstualiziranih integracija u višestrukim nastavama. Korisnosti MaChAmp su njegove fleksibilne opcije konfiguracije, i podrška raznih zadataka prirodnog jezika obrađivanja u jednostavnom korištenju alata, od tekstske klasifikacije i označavanja etikete do analize zavisnosti, maskiranog jezika i proizvodnje teksta.', 'nl': 'Transferleren, met name benaderingen die multitask leren combineren met vooraf getrainde contextualiseerde embeddings en finetuning, hebben het gebied van Natural Language Processing de afgelopen jaren enorm verbeterd. In dit artikel presenteren we MaChAmp, een toolkit voor het eenvoudig fine-tunen van contextualiseerde embeddings in multi-task instellingen. De voordelen van MaChAmp zijn de flexibele configuratieopties en de ondersteuning van een verscheidenheid aan bewerkingstaken voor natuurlijke taal in een uniforme toolkit, van tekstclassificatie en sequence labeling tot afhankelijkheidsparsing, gemaskerde taalmodellering en tekstgeneratie.', 'de': 'Transferlernen, insbesondere Ansätze, die Multi-Task-Lernen mit vortrainierten kontextualisierten Einbettungen und Feinabstimmungen kombinieren, haben den Bereich der Natural Language Processing in den letzten Jahren enorm vorangebracht. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir MaChAmp vor, ein Toolkit zur einfachen Feinabstimmung kontextualisierter Einbettungen in Multi-Task-Einstellungen. Die Vorteile von MaChAmp sind seine flexiblen Konfigurationsoptionen und die Unterstützung einer Vielzahl von Aufgaben der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache in einem einheitlichen Toolkit, von der Textklassifizierung und Sequenzbeschreibung über Abhängigkeitsparsing, maskierte Sprachmodellierung und Texterstellung.', 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 이동 학습, 특히 다중 임무 학습과 사전 훈련의 어경화 삽입과 미조를 결합시키는 방법은 자연 언어 처리 분야의 발전을 크게 추진했다.이 문서에서 MaChAmp을 소개했는데 이것은 다중 작업 환경에서 상하문에 쉽게 삽입할 수 있는 도구 패키지입니다.MaChAmp의 장점은 유연한 설정 옵션과 통일된 도구 패키지에서 다양한 자연 언어 처리 작업을 지원하는 데 있다. 텍스트 분류와 서열 표시부터 의존 항목 해석, 언어 모델링 및 텍스트 생성을 차단하는 것이다.', 'id': 'Pembelajaran transfer, terutama pendekatan yang menggabungkan pembelajaran multi-tugas dengan penerbangan kontekstualisasi dan penyesuaian prapelatihan, telah meningkatkan bidang Bahasa Alam Proses luar biasa dalam bertahun-tahun terakhir. Dalam kertas ini kami memperkenalkan MaChAmp, sebuah toolkit untuk mudah memperbaiki penerbangan kontekstualisasi dalam pengaturan multi-tugas. The benefits of MaChAmp are its flexible configuration options, and the support of a variety of natural language processing tasks in a uniform toolkit, from text classification and sequence labeling to dependency parsing, masked language modeling, and text generation.', 'fa': 'تعلیم انتقال، مخصوصاً نزدیک\u200cهایی که در سال\u200cهای اخیر آموخته شده\u200cاند، آموزش تعلیم\u200cهای زیادی از کار\u200cها را ترکیب می\u200cکنند، با استفاده\u200cهای پیش آموزش شده\u200cاند و تنظیم\u200cهای زیادی، زمینه\u200cی پرداخت زبان طبیعی زیادی در طو در این کاغذ ما ماچامپ را نشان می دهیم، یک کاغذ ابزار برای آسان تنظیم کردن ابزارهای متوسط در تنظیمات زیادی کار. مفید MaChAmp گزینه\u200cهای پیکربندی قابل flexible و پشتیبانی از کارهای مختلف پردازش زبان طبیعی در یک کیت ابزار متن، از برچسب\u200cبندی متن و برچسب\u200cبندی به برچسب بستگی، مدل\u200cبندی زبان ماسک و نسل متن است.', 'sw': 'Kubadilisha kujifunza, hususani mbinu zinazounganisha kujifunza kwa kazi nyingi pamoja na maendeleo ya awali na mafunzo mazuri, wameboresha maendeleo ya utaratibu wa lugha ya asili katika miaka ya hivi karibuni. Katika gazeti hili tunalowasilisha MaChAmp, kituo cha vifaa kwa ajili ya kutangaza vizuri vizuri katika mazingira mengi ya kazi. Manufadhi ya MaChAmp ni chaguo la ubunifu, na kuunga mkono kazi mbalimbali za upasuaji wa lugha asilia katika vifaa vya kiuniform, kutoka kwa usambazaji wa maandishi na mfululizo unaoelezea kutegemea parsing, modeling of language masked, na kizazi cha maandishi.', 'tr': "Taryh öwrenmeleri, özellikle köp-täblik öwrenmeleri öňünden öňünden öňünden geçirilen contest öwrenmeleri bilen birleştirip, tebigy dil işlemleriniň sahypyny soňky ýyllarda örän öňündi. Bu kagyzda MaChAmp'i köp-täblik düzenlemek üçin ýeňil ýerleşmek üçin ýeterli ýerleşmek üçin ýerleşdiriyoruz. MaChAmp üçin ýeterlik ýerleri fleksib konfigurasiýanyň seçenekleri, we tebigy diller işlemegi üçin bir uniform araç çykmasynda, metin klasifikasyndan we sıralama etiketlerinden baglanylyk ayırmaga, maskeli diller modellendirmegi we metin döretmegi üçin ullanýarlar.", 'af': "Oordrag leer, veral toeganklike toegang wat multi-taak leer met voor-opgelei konteksualiseerde inbêdings en fyn-tuning kombinieer, het die veld van Natuurlike Taal Prosessering in onlangse jaar uitgevorderd. In hierdie papier voorsien ons MaChAmp 'n nutsbalk vir maklik fin- tuning van kontekstualiseerde inbêdings in multi- task instellings. Die voordele van MaChAmp is sy fleksibel konfigurasie opsies, en die ondersteun van 'n verskillende natuurlike taal verwerking opdragte in 'n eenvoudige nutsbalk, van teks klassifikasie en sekwensieetiketing tot afhanklikheid verwerking, maskeerde taal modeling en teks generasie.", 'am': 'ትምህርት ማቀናቀል፣ በተለይም የብዙ ስራ ትምህርት ማቀናቀል በተቀድሞው ቀድሞ ተማሪዎችን እና ጥሩ ማቀናቀል እና በመቀናኛው ዓመታት የናብሬካዊ ቋንቋ መሬት በጣም የበለጠ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም ማሕትአሜን በብዙ ስራ አካባቢዎች ላይ የተቀናቀለውን የውጤት ማቀናጃ ማቀናጃ እናቀርባታለን፡፡ The benefits of MaChAmp are its flexible configuration options, and the support of a variety of natural language processing tasks in a uniform toolkit, from text classification and sequence labeling to dependency parsing, masked language modeling, and text generation.', 'sq': 'Mësimi transferues, veçanërisht qasjet që kombinojnë mësimin shumëdetyror me përfshirjet kontekstuale të paratrajnuara dhe përmirësimet, kanë përparuar mjaft fushën e Procesimit të Gjuhave Natyrore në vitet e fundit. Në këtë letër prezantojmë MaChAmp, një paketë mjete për rregullimin e lehtë të përfshirjeve kontekstuale në rregullime me shumë detyra. përfitimet e MaChAmp janë opsionet e konfigurimit fleksibel të saj dhe mbështetja e një shumicë detyrash natyrore të procesimit të gjuhës në një paketë mjetesh uniforme, nga klasifikimi i tekstit dhe etiketat e sekuencës deri në analizimin e varësisë, modelimin e gjuhës së maskuar dhe gjenerimin e tekstit.', 'az': "Öyrənmək öyrənməsi, xüsusilə çoxlu işin öyrənməsini öyrənməsi və təhsil edilməsi ilə birləşdirilən çoxlu işin öyrənməsi, son illərdə təhsil dili işləməsi sahəsini çox yüksəltdi. Bu kağızda MaChAmp'i çoxlu işlər qurğularında asanlaşdırmaq üçün asanlaşdırmaq üçün istifadə etdik. MaChAmp'in faydaları onun fleksibil konfigurasiyanın seçimləridir, və təbiətli dil işləmə işlərinin müxtəlif təbiətli işləri uniform alet kitabında, metin klasifikasiyasından və sıralama etiketindən bağlılıq ayırmasına, maskəli dil modellərinə və metin nəsilinə destekləndir.", 'bn': 'শিক্ষা পরিবর্তন করুন, বিশেষ করে প্রশিক্ষিত বিভিন্ন প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিযোগিতা এবং সুন্দর ভাষার ক্ষেত্রে বহুক্ষেত্র শিক্ষা সম্পূর্ণ ক্ষে এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ম্যাচ এমপ উপস্থাপন করছি, যা মাল্টিক কাজের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর প্রতিযোগিতায় সহজ সুন্দর করার জন্য একটি টুলবিকেট। মানচিএমপের সুবিধা হচ্ছে তার ফ্লিক্সিবল কনফিগারেশন বিকল্প এবং একটি ইউনিফর্ম টুলবিটে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার কাজের সমর্থন, টেক্সফিকেশন এবং সেকেন্ড লেবেল থে', 'bs': 'Naučenje prijenosa, posebno pristupe koje kombiniraju učenje multizadataka sa predobučenim kontekstualizacijskim integracijama i finalnim prilagođavanjem, u posljednjih godina su izuzetno napredovale polje procesa prirodnog jezika. U ovom papiru predstavljamo MaChAmp, toolkit za lako ispravljanje kontekstualiziranih integracija u multi task postavkama. Prihode MaChAmp a su njegove fleksibilne opcije konfiguracije, i podrška raznih zadataka prirodnog jezika obrađivanja u uniformnom korištenju alata, od klasifikacije teksta i etikete sekvencije do analize zavisnosti, maskiranog jezika i proizvodnje teksta.', 'hy': 'Գործողական ուսումնասիրությունը, հատկապես այն մոտեցումները, որոնք համադրում են բազմախնդիրների ուսումնասիրությունը նախապատրաստված կոնտեքստալիզացված ներդրումների և բարելավման հետ, զարգացրել են վերջին տարիների ընթացքում բնական լեզուների գործընթացը: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք MaChAmp-ը, մի գործիքների շարք, որպեսզի պարզ կարգավորենք բազմախնդիրների միջոցներում կոնտեքստալիզացված ներդրումները: MaChAmp-ի շահույթները նրա ճկուն կառուցվածքային տարբերակներն են, և աջակցությունը տարբեր բնական լեզվի վերամշակման խնդիրների օգնությամբ համապատասխան գործիքների շարքում, տեքստի դասակարգումից և հաջորդականության պիտակումից մինչև կախվածության վերամշակ', 'et': 'Üleminekuõpe, eriti lähenemisviisid, mis ühendavad mitme ülesandega õppimist eelnevalt koolitatud kontekstipõhiste manustamiste ja täpsustamisega, on viimastel aastatel loodusliku keele töötlemise valdkonda tohutult arendanud. Käesolevas töös tutvustame MaChAmpi, tööriistakomplekti kontekstipõhiste manustamiste lihtsaks häälestamiseks mitme ülesandega seadetes. MaChAmpi eelised on paindlikud konfiguratsioonivõimalused ja erinevate looduskeele töötlemise ülesannete toetamine ühtses tööriistakomplektis, alates teksti klassifitseerimisest ja järjestuse märgistamisest kuni sõltuvuse parsimiseni, maskeeritud keele modelleerimise ja teksti genereerimiseni.', 'fi': 'Siirto-oppiminen, erityisesti lähestymistavat, joissa yhdistetään monitehtäväoppiminen esikoulutettuihin kontekstualisoituihin upotuksiin ja hienosäätöön, ovat edistyneet luonnonkielen käsittelyn alalla valtavasti viime vuosina. Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme MaChAmp-työkalupakin kontekstualisoitujen upotusten hienosäätöön monitehtävissä asetuksissa. MaChAmpin edut ovat joustavat konfigurointivaihtoehdot ja erilaisten luonnollisten kielten käsittelytehtävien tukeminen yhtenäisessä työkalupakissa tekstin luokittelusta ja sekvenssimerkinnöistä riippuvuuden jäsentämiseen, peitetyn kielen mallinnukseen ja tekstin tuottamiseen.', 'ca': "L'aprenentatge de transferència, en especial els enfocaments que combinan l'aprenentatge multitasca amb incorporacions contextualitzades i ajustes previament entrenats, ha avançat enormement en els últims anys en el camp del Procesament de Llingua Natural. In this paper we present MaChAmp, a toolkit for easy fine-tuning of contextualized embeddings in multi-task settings.  Els beneficis de MaChAmp són les seves opcions de configuració flexibles, i el suport d'una varietat de tasques naturals de processament de llenguatges en un conjunt d'eines uniforme, des de la classificació de text i l'etiquetada de seqüències fins l'analització de dependencies, la modelació mascada de llenguatges i la generació de text.", 'cs': 'Transferové učení, zejména přístupy, které kombinují víceúlohové učení s předškolenými kontextualizovanými vloženími a jemným laděním, v posledních letech značně pokročily oblast zpracování přirozeného jazyka. V tomto článku představujeme MaChAmp, sadu nástrojů pro snadné doladění kontextualizovaných vložení v multi-úlohovém nastavení. Výhodou MaChAmpu jsou flexibilní možnosti konfigurace a podpora různých úloh zpracování přirozeného jazyka v jednotné sadě nástrojů, od klasifikace textu a popisování sekvencí až po analýzu závislostí, modelování maskovaného jazyka a generování textu.', 'jv': 'Nalikahan kanggo ngilangno, langgar sampek kanggo ngerasai multi-task kang sampek mulai sistem sing sujih-cara nggawe lan ijol-tuning, iso mulai perusaha kapan kanggo langgambar aturan sing komplikasi layar. Nang pemilih iki, kita ngawehi MaHamp, barang kelompok kanggo langgar-nggawe barang kelas barang contextual embedding in multi-task settings. Menu Benerah', 'ha': "Ka motsa shirin karantawa, da haske masu motsi wanda ke haɗa wa masu aikin multi-aiki da aka yi wa zaman-wa'anar da wanda aka haramtar da shi na kafin-tundin, sun ƙarfafa field na aikin Lugha na Natural da ke aiki mai girma a shekara na farkon. Ga wannan takardan da Muke iya ƙayyade MaChAmp, wata kafin wa mai sauƙi wa tunkuɗe wa masu sakacin shiryarwa da aka saka cikin tsarin aiki masu yawa. Yin amfani da MaChAmp yana da zaɓen canza tsari masu lokaci, kuma yana ƙarani da aikin masu aikin aiki masu aikin harshen na asali cikin zane-zane masu kiyaye, daga fasalin matsayi da sauran da za'a yi amfani da zuwa masu dõgara ga parse, da misalin harshe wanda aka rufe da shi, da kuma kizaɓen matsayi.", 'he': 'Transfer learning, particularly approaches that combine multi-task learning with pre-trained contextualized embeddings and fine-tuning, have advanced the field of Natural Language Processing tremendously in recent years.  בעיתון הזה אנו מציגים MaChAmp, חבילת כלים לטיוון קל של תוכניות קונטוקטואליזציות במסדרות multi-task. היתרונות של MaChAmp הן אפשרויות הגישה הגמישות שלה, ותמיכה של מגוון של משימות עיבוד שפת טבעיות בתוך ערכת כלים משותפת, מגוון טקסט ותיקוי רצף לתיקוי התלויות, בדיקת שפת מוסכת, ודור טקסט.', 'sk': 'Prenosno učenje, zlasti pristopi, ki združujejo večopravilno učenje z vnaprej usposobljenimi kontekstualiziranimi vdelavami in finimi nastavitvami, so v zadnjih letih zelo napredovali na področju obdelave naravnega jezika. V tem prispevku predstavljamo MaChAmp, orodje za enostavno nastavitev kontekstualnih vdelav v večopravilnih nastavitvah. Prednosti MaChAmp so prilagodljive možnosti konfiguracije in podpora različnih opravil obdelave naravnega jezika v enotnem orodju, od klasifikacije besedila in označevanja zaporedja do razčlenitve odvisnosti, maskiranega jezikovnega modeliranja in ustvarjanja besedila.', 'bo': 'སྤྲོད་གཞུང་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་སྐོར་ཡུལ། ཁྱད་པར་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སྣ་ཚོགས་ལས་རྗེས་སུ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་MaChAmp ལ་སྤྱོད་ཆས་པ་ཞིག་ནི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་ཚད་མང་ཙམ་ལ་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ནང The benefits of MaChAmp are its flexible configuration options, and the support of a variety of natural language processing tasks in a uniform toolkit, from text classification and sequence labeling to dependency parsing, masked language modeling, and text generation.'}
{'en': 'European Language Grid : A Joint Platform for the European Language Technology Community', 'pt': 'European Language Grid: Uma Plataforma Conjunta para a Comunidade Europeia de Tecnologia da Língua', 'fr': 'European Language Grid\xa0: une plateforme commune pour la communauté européenne des technologies langagières', 'ar': 'شبكة اللغة الأوروبية: منصة مشتركة لمجتمع تكنولوجيا اللغة الأوروبية', 'es': 'European Language Grid: una plataforma conjunta para la comunidad europea de tecnología lingüística', 'hi': 'यूरोपीय भाषा ग्रिड: यूरोपीय भाषा प्रौद्योगिकी समुदाय के लिए एक संयुक्त मंच', 'ja': 'ヨーロッパ言語グリッド：ヨーロッパ言語技術コミュニティのための共同プラットフォーム', 'zh': '欧洲语网格:欧洲语术共同体合平台', 'ru': 'Европейская языковая сеть: совместная платформа для Европейского сообщества языковых технологий', 'ga': 'Eangach Eorpach Teanga: Ardán Comhpháirteach don Chomhphobal Eorpach um Theicneolaíocht Teanga', 'ka': 'ევროპოლური ენების სახელი: ერთადერთი პლატორმა იგოპოლური ენების ტექნოლოგიური სახელი', 'hu': 'Európai nyelvi hálózat: az európai nyelvtechnológiai közösség közös platformja', 'it': 'Rete linguistica europea: una piattaforma comune per la Comunità europea delle tecnologie linguistiche', 'el': 'Ευρωπαϊκό Δίκτυο Γλωσσών: Κοινή Πλατφόρμα για την Ευρωπαϊκή Κοινότητα Γλωσσικής Τεχνολογίας', 'kk': 'Еуропалық тіл торы: Еуропалық тіл технологиялық Компания үшін біріктірілген платформа', 'ml': 'യൂറോപ്യന്\u200d ഭാഷ ഗ്രിഡ്: യൂറോപ്യന്\u200d ഭാഷ ടെക്നോളജി സമൂഹം', 'mk': 'European Language Grid: A Joint Platform for the European Language Technology Community', 'ms': 'Grid Bahasa Eropah: Platform Bersama untuk Komuniti Teknologi Bahasa Eropah', 'mt': 'European Language Grid: A Joint Platform for the European Language Technology Community', 'mn': 'Европын хэл хязгаар: Европын хэл технологийн нийтлэг платформ', 'no': 'Europeisk språk-rutenett: Eit samt plattform for Europeisk språk-teknologiske fellesskap', 'pl': 'Europejska Sieć Językowa: Wspólna Platforma Europejskiej Wspólnoty Technologii Językowej', 'ro': 'Rețeaua lingvistică europeană: o platformă comună pentru Comunitatea europeană a tehnologiilor lingvistice', 'lt': 'Europos kalbų tinklas: Bendra Europos kalbų technologijų bendrijos platforma', 'sr': 'Evropska jezička mreža: Joint Platform for the European Language Technology Community', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Rugta afka Yurub: A Joint Platform for the European language Technology Community', 'sv': 'Europeiskt språknät: En gemensam plattform för den europeiska språkteknikgemenskapen', 'ur': 'اروپای زبان گریڈ: اروپای زبان تکنولوژی کمپنٹی کے لئے ایک ملک پلٹورم', 'ta': 'ஐரோப்பிய மொழி கட்டம்:', 'vi': 'Chương trình phát thanh Ngôn ngữ Châu Âu: Một chương trình phát biểu cho Cộng đồng Ngôn ngữ', 'uz': 'Oyropa tili grid: Yevropacha teknologiya Community uchun Joint Platform', 'nl': 'Europees taalnetwerk: een gezamenlijk platform voor de Europese Gemeenschap voor taaltechnologie', 'de': 'European Language Grid: Eine gemeinsame Plattform für die Europäische Sprachtechnologiegemeinschaft', 'id': 'Jaringan Bahasa Eropa: Satu Platform Berkongsi untuk Komunitas Teknologi Bahasa Eropa', 'bg': 'Европейска езикова мрежа: Съвместна платформа за Европейската общност за езикови технологии', 'hr': 'Europska jezička mreža: zajednička platforma za Europsku zajednicu jezičke tehnologije', 'da': 'Europæisk sprognet: En fælles platform for Det Europæiske Sprogteknologifællesskab', 'ko': '유럽 언어 격자: 유럽 언어 기술 공동체의 연합 플랫폼', 'sw': 'Tovuti ya lugha ya Ulaya: Jukwaa la Joint kwa Jumuiya ya Teknolojia ya Ulaya', 'tr': 'Ýewropa Dili Grid: Ewropa dil teknolojisi jemgyýetiniň bir birleşik platformy', 'af': 'Name', 'fa': 'گریز زبان اروپایی: یک گریز متحده برای اجتماعی تکنولوژی زبان اروپایی', 'sq': 'Rrjeti Evropian i Gjuhave: Një Platform ë e Përbashkët për Komunitetin Evropian të Teknologjisë së Gjuhave', 'am': 'የኢትዮጵያ ቋንቋ Grid: A Joint Platform for the European language Technology Community', 'hy': 'Եվրոպական լեզվի ցանց. Եվրոպական լեզվի տեխնոլոգիաների համայնքի միավոր պլատֆորմ', 'az': 'Avropa Dili Grid: Avropa Dili Teknoloji Kompaniyası üçün birləşdirilmiş Platform', 'bs': 'Evropska jezička mreža: zajednička platforma za Europsku zajednicu jezičke tehnologije', 'bn': 'ইউরোপিয়ান ভাষা গ্রিড: ইউরোপিয়ান ভাষা প্রযুক্তি কমিউনিটির জন্য একটি যৌথ প্ল্যাটফর্ম', 'ca': 'Una plataforma conjunta per a la comunitat europea de tecnologia lingüística', 'cs': 'Evropská jazyková síť: Společná platforma pro evropské společenství jazykových technologií', 'et': 'Euroopa keelevõrk: Euroopa keeltehnoloogia ühenduse ühine platvorm', 'fi': 'Euroopan kieliverkko: Euroopan kieliteknologiayhteisön yhteinen foorumi', 'jv': 'Spanish', 'sk': 'Evropska jezikovna mreža: Skupna platforma za Evropsko skupnost jezikovne tehnologije', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཤིག་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གི་དྲ་རྒྱ་སུ།', 'he': 'European Language Grid: A Joint Platform for the European Language Technology Community'}
{'en': 'Europe is a multilingual society, in which dozens of languages are spoken. The only option to enable and to benefit from multilingualism is through Language Technologies (LT), i.e., Natural Language Processing and Speech Technologies. We describe the European Language Grid (ELG), which is targeted to evolve into the primary platform and marketplace for LT in Europe by providing one umbrella platform for the European LT landscape, including research and industry, enabling all stakeholders to upload, share and distribute their services, products and resources. At the end of our EU project, which will establish a legal entity in 2022, the ELG will provide access to approx. 1300 services for all European languages as well as thousands of data sets.', 'ar': 'أوروبا مجتمع متعدد اللغات ، حيث يتم التحدث بالعشرات من اللغات. الخيار الوحيد لتمكين التعددية اللغوية والاستفادة منها هو من خلال تقنيات اللغة (LT) ، أي معالجة اللغة الطبيعية وتقنيات الكلام. نحن نصف شبكة اللغة الأوروبية (ELG) ، والتي تهدف إلى التطور إلى النظام الأساسي والسوق الأساسي لـ LT في أوروبا من خلال توفير منصة شاملة واحدة لمشهد LT الأوروبي ، بما في ذلك البحث والصناعة ، مما يمكّن جميع أصحاب المصلحة من التحميل والمشاركة والتوزيع خدماتهم ومنتجاتهم ومواردهم. في نهاية مشروع الاتحاد الأوروبي الخاص بنا ، والذي سينشئ كيانًا قانونيًا في عام 2022 ، ستوفر ELG الوصول إلى تقريبًا. 1300 خدمة لجميع اللغات الأوروبية بالإضافة إلى آلاف مجموعات البيانات.', 'es': 'Europa es una sociedad multilingüe, en la que se hablan docenas de idiomas. La única opción para habilitar y beneficiarse del multilingüismo es a través de las Tecnologías del Lenguaje (LT), es decir, el procesamiento del lenguaje natural y las tecnologías del habla. Describimos European Language Grid (ELG), cuyo objetivo es convertirse en la plataforma principal y el mercado de LT en Europa al proporcionar una plataforma paraguas para el panorama europeo de LT, incluidas la investigación y la industria, lo que permite a todas las partes interesadas cargar, compartir y distribuir sus servicios y productos y recursos. Al final de nuestro proyecto de la UE, que establecerá una entidad legal en 2022, el ELG proporcionará acceso a aproximadamente 1300 servicios para todos los idiomas europeos, así como a miles de conjuntos de datos.', 'fr': "L'Europe est une société multilingue, dans laquelle des dizaines de langues sont parlées. La seule option permettant d'activer le multilinguisme et d'en tirer parti consiste à utiliser les technologies langagières (LT), c'est-à-dire le traitement du langage naturel et les technologies de la parole. Nous décrivons le European Language Grid (ELG), qui vise à devenir la plate-forme et le marché principaux pour la LT en Europe en fournissant une plate-forme globale pour le paysage européen de la LT, y compris la recherche et l'industrie, permettant à toutes les parties prenantes de télécharger, partager et distribuer leurs services et produits et ressources. À la fin de notre projet européen, qui créera une entité juridique en 2022, l'ELG donnera accès à environ 1 300 services pour toutes les langues européennes ainsi qu'à des milliers d'ensembles de données.", 'pt': 'A Europa é uma sociedade multilingue, na qual se falam dezenas de línguas. A única opção para habilitar e se beneficiar do multilinguismo é através das Tecnologias de Linguagem (LT), ou seja, Processamento de Linguagem Natural e Tecnologias de Fala. Descrevemos a European Language Grid (ELG), que visa evoluir para a principal plataforma e mercado de LT na Europa, fornecendo uma plataforma abrangente para o cenário europeu de LT, incluindo pesquisa e indústria, permitindo que todas as partes interessadas carreguem, compartilhem e distribuam seus serviços, produtos e recursos. No final do nosso projeto da UE, que estabelecerá uma entidade legal em 2022, o ELG fornecerá acesso a aprox. 1300 serviços para todas as línguas europeias, bem como milhares de conjuntos de dados.', 'ja': 'ヨーロッパは多言語社会であり、数十の言語が話されています。多言語を有効にし、その恩恵を受けるための唯一の選択肢は、言語技術（ LT ）、すなわち自然言語処理と音声技術です。ヨーロッパ言語グリッド（ ELG ）について説明します。これは、研究と業界を含むヨーロッパのLTの景観に1つの傘のプラットフォームを提供し、すべてのステークホルダーがサービス、製品、リソースをアップロード、共有、配布できるようにすることで、ヨーロッパのLTの主要なプラットフォームとマーケットプレイスに進化することを目標としています。2022年に法人を設立するEUプロジェクトの終わりに、ELGは、すべてのヨーロッパの言語と数千のデータセットに約1300のサービスへのアクセスを提供します。', 'zh': '欧洲多言语,中有几十种语。 多言而益者,(LT)也,自然语言语音也。 述欧洲语网格(ELG),指为欧LT领域(兼治工业)供一伞形台,使诸利相关者得上传,共享分其服务,产品资源,以成LT平市于欧洲。 臣等欧盟项目将于2022年立一法实体,当项目终时,ELG将为诸欧洲语供约1300种服务及数千数集。', 'hi': 'यूरोप एक बहुभाषी समाज है, जिसमें दर्जनों भाषाएं बोली जाती हैं। बहुभाषीवाद को सक्षम करने और लाभ उठाने का एकमात्र विकल्प भाषा प्रौद्योगिकियों (एलटी) के माध्यम से है, अर्थात्, प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण और भाषण प्रौद्योगिकियों। हम यूरोपीय भाषा ग्रिड (ELG) का वर्णन करते हैं, जिसे अनुसंधान और उद्योग सहित यूरोपीय एलटी परिदृश्य के लिए एक छाता मंच प्रदान करके यूरोप में एलटी के लिए प्राथमिक मंच और बाजार में विकसित करने का लक्ष्य रखा गया है, जिससे सभी हितधारकों को अपनी सेवाओं, उत्पादों और संसाधनों को अपलोड करने, साझा करने और वितरित करने में सक्षम बनाया जा सकता है। हमारी यूरोपीय संघ की परियोजना के अंत में, जो 2022 में एक कानूनी इकाई स्थापित करेगा, ईएलजी सभी यूरोपीय भाषाओं के साथ-साथ हजारों डेटा सेट के लिए लगभग 1300 सेवाओं तक पहुंच प्रदान करेगा।', 'ru': 'Европа - это многоязычное общество, в котором говорят на десятках языков. Единственным вариантом обеспечения многоязычия и извлечения из него пользы являются языковые технологии (ЛТ), т.е. технологии обработки естественного языка и речи. Мы описываем Европейскую языковую сеть (ELG), которая нацелена на превращение в основную платформу и рынок для LT в Европе, предоставляя единую зонтичную платформу для европейского ландшафта LT, включая исследования и промышленность, позволяющую всем заинтересованным сторонам загружать, делиться и распространять свои услуги, продукты и ресурсы. В конце нашего проекта ЕС, в рамках которого в 2022 году будет создано юридическое лицо, ELG предоставит доступ к примерно 1300 услугам для всех европейских языков, а также к тысячам наборов данных.', 'ga': 'Sochaí ilteangach is ea an Eoraip, ina labhraítear mórán teangacha. Is é an t-aon rogha amháin chun an t-ilteangachas a chumasú agus chun leas a bhaint as ná trí Theicneolaíochtaí Teanga (LT), i.e., Próiseáil Teanga Nádúrtha agus Teicneolaíochtaí Urlabhra. Déanaimid cur síos ar an Eangach Eorpach Teanga (ELG), a bhfuil sé mar aidhm aige éabhlóid a dhéanamh mar phríomh-ardán agus ionad margaidh do LT san Eoraip trí scáthardán amháin a sholáthar do thírdhreach LT na hEorpa, lena n-áirítear taighde agus tionscal, ag cur ar chumas na bpáirtithe leasmhara go léir uaslódáil, roinnt agus dáileadh. a gcuid seirbhísí, táirgí agus acmhainní. Ag deireadh ár dtionscadal AE, a bhunóidh eintiteas dlíthiúil in 2022, soláthróidh an ELG rochtain ar thart ar. 1300 seirbhís do gach teanga Eorpach chomh maith leis na mílte tacair sonraí.', 'hu': 'Európa egy többnyelvű társadalom, amelyben több tucat nyelvet beszélnek. Az egyetlen lehetőség a többnyelvűség engedélyezésére és előnyeinek előnyeit a nyelvi technológiák (LT), azaz a természetes nyelvfeldolgozás és beszédtechnológiák segítségével teszi lehetővé. Leírjuk az Európai Nyelvi Hálózatot (ELG), amelynek célja, hogy a LT elsődleges platformjává és piacává váljon Európában azáltal, hogy egyetlen ernyőplatformot biztosít az európai LT környezet számára, beleértve a kutatást és az ipart is, lehetővé téve az összes érdekelt fél számára szolgáltatásaik, termékeik és erőforrásaik feltöltését, megosztását és terjesztését. Az EU projektjének végén, amely 2022-ben jogi személyt hoz létre, az ELG mintegy 1300 szolgáltatást biztosít minden európai nyelv számára, valamint több ezer adatkészlethez.', 'el': 'Η Ευρώπη είναι μια πολύγλωσση κοινωνία, στην οποία ομιλούνται δεκάδες γλώσσες. Η μόνη επιλογή για την ενεργοποίηση και την αξιοποίηση της πολυγλωσσίας είναι μέσω των γλωσσικών τεχνολογιών (LT), δηλαδή των τεχνολογιών επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας και ομιλίας. Περιγράφουμε το Ευρωπαϊκό Δίκτυο Γλωσσών (ΕΛG), το οποίο έχει ως στόχο να εξελιχθεί στην κύρια πλατφόρμα και αγορά για την Γλωσσική Γλωσσική Γλώσσα στην Ευρώπη παρέχοντας μια πλατφόρμα ομπρέλας για το ευρωπαϊκό τοπίο της Γλωσσικής Γλώσσας, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της έρευνας και της βιομηχανίας, επιτρέποντας σε όλους τους ενδιαφερόμενους να ανεβάζουν, να μοιράζονται και να διανέμουν τις υπηρεσίες, τα προϊόντα και τους πόρους τους. Στο τέλος του έργου της ΕΕ, το οποίο θα δημιουργήσει νομική οντότητα τον 2022, το ΕΛG θα παρέχει πρόσβαση σε υπηρεσίες περίπου 1300 για όλες τις ευρωπαϊκές γλώσσες καθώς και σε χιλιάδες σύνολα δεδομένων.', 'ka': 'ევროპა არის მრავალენგური საზოგადოება, რომელიც ესეულები ენების საუბრობა. მულტილური ტექნოლოგიების გამოსახულება და გამოსახულება მნიშვნელოვანების გამოსახულება არის ენის ტექნოლოგიების გამოსახულება (LT), მაგალითად, Natural Language Processing and Speech Technologies. ჩვენ აღწერეთ ევროპოლური ენახური გრძელი (ELG), რომელიც უნდა განვითარება LT-ის პირველ პლატატურში და მარკეტურში იყოს, რომელიც იყოს ერთი ომპრატატური პლატატური, რომელიც ვუპოლური LT პლანექატურის პლანექატურ ჩვენი პროექტის დასასრულებაში, რომელიც 2022 წლის ადგილის შექმნა, ELG-ს დაეხმარება მხოლოდ. 1300 სერვისები ყველა ეგოპონური ენებისთვის და ათასობით მონაცემების შესახებ', 'it': "L'Europa è una società multilingue, in cui si parlano decine di lingue. L'unica opzione per abilitare e beneficiare del multilinguismo è attraverso le tecnologie linguistiche (LT), vale a dire l'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale e le tecnologie vocali. Descriviamo l'European Language Grid (ELG), che ha l'obiettivo di evolversi verso la piattaforma e il mercato primario per LT in Europa fornendo un'unica piattaforma ombrello per il panorama LT europeo, compresa la ricerca e l'industria, consentendo a tutte le parti interessate di caricare, condividere e distribuire i propri servizi, prodotti e risorse. Al termine del nostro progetto UE, che istituirà una persona giuridica nel 2022, l'ELG fornirà accesso a circa 1300 servizi per tutte le lingue europee e a migliaia di set di dati.", 'lt': 'Europa yra daugiakalbė visuomenė, kurioje kalbama tuzina kalbų. Vienintelė galimybė sudaryti galimybę daugiakalbystei ir ją pasinaudoti – pasitelkti kalbų technologijas (LT), t. y. gamtos kalbų apdorojimo ir kalbos technologijas. Mes apibūdiname Europos kalbų tinklą (ELG), kuriuo siekiama plėtoti pagrindinę platform ą ir LT rinką Europoje, pasitelkiant vieną bendrą platformą Europos LT kraštovaizdžiui, įskaitant mokslinius tyrimus ir pramonę, kad visi suinteresuotieji subjektai galėtų įkelti, dalytis ir platinti savo paslaugas, produktus ir išteklius. Pasibaigus ES projektui, kuris 2022 m. įsteigs juridinį subjektą, ELG suteiks galimybę naudotis maždaug 1300 paslaugų visoms Europos kalboms ir tūkstančiams duomenų rinkinių.', 'kk': 'Еуропа - көптеген тілдер қоғамдығы, онда жүздеген тілдер сөйлейді. Көптеген лингвизмдік технологиялықтан жұмыс істеу және қолдануға арналған жалғыз параметр - тіл технологиялық (LT) арқылы, т.е. Natural Language Processing and Speech Technologies. Біз Еуропалық тіл торын (ELG) түсіндіреміз. Бұл Еуропалық LT бағдарламасының негізгі платформасына және маркеттеріне өзгерту үшін Еуропалық LT бағдарламасының бір шампан платформасын, зерттеу және индустриясының қосымша, барлық қатынасушыларын ЕС жобасымыздың соңында, 2022 жылы заң құрылғысын орнату үшін ELG барлық Еуропалық тілдер және миңдеген деректер жиындарына қатынау мүмкіндігін жеткізеді.', 'mk': 'Европа е мултијазично општество, во кое се зборуваат десетици јазици. Единствената опција за овозможување и користење од мултијазизмот е преку јазичните технологии (ЛТ), т.е., природните јазични процеси и говорни технологии. Ја опишуваме Европската јазична мрежа (ЕЛГ), која има за цел еволуција во примарната платформа и пазарот за ЛТ во Европа со обезбедување на една платформа за европскиот ландшафт на ЛТ, вклучувајќи го истражувањето и индустријата, овозможувајќи им на сите интересни страни да ги пренесат, делат и дистрибу На крајот од нашиот проект на ЕУ, кој ќе формира правен ентитет во 2022 година, ЕЛГ ќе обезбеди пристап до околу 1300 услуги за сите европски јазици, како и илјадници податоци.', 'ms': 'Eropah adalah masyarakat berbilang bahasa, di mana puluhan bahasa dibicarakan. Satu-satunya pilihan untuk memungkinkan dan mengambil manfaat dari kebanyakan bahasa adalah melalui Teknologi Bahasa (LT), iaitu, Perprosesan Bahasa Alami dan Teknologi Cahaya. Kami menggambarkan Grid Bahasa Eropah (ELG), yang ditujukan untuk berevolusi menjadi platform utama dan pasar untuk LT di Eropah dengan menyediakan satu platform payung untuk landscape LT Eropah, termasuk kajian dan industri, membolehkan semua pihak berminat untuk memuat naik, berkongsi dan mengedarkan perkhidmatan, produk dan sumber mereka. Pada akhir projek EU kami, yang akan menetapkan entiti undang-undang pada 2022, ELG akan menyediakan akses kepada kira-kira 1300 perkhidmatan untuk semua bahasa Eropah serta ribuan set data.', 'ml': 'യൂറോപ്പ് പല ഭാഷ സമൂഹത്താണ്. അതില്\u200d പല ഭാഷകളും സംസാരിക്കുന്നു. പല ഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉപകാരം പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്ന ഏക ഐച്ഛികം ഭാഷ ടെക്നോളജിയുടെ (LT), അതായത് സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്രക്ര യൂറോപ്പിലെ ലോട്ട്ഫോമിലേയ്ക്കും മാര്\u200dക്കറ്റിലേക്കും വികസിക്കാനുള്ള യൂറോപ്പ് ഭാഷ ഗ്രിഡിലേക്കും നമ്മള്\u200d വിവരിക്കുന്നു. യൂറോപ്പിലെ ലാന്\u200dഡ്സ്കേപിലേക്കും ഒരു പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമിലേ നമ്മുടെ യൂറോപ്പ് പ്രോജക്റ്റ് അവസാനം 2022 ല്\u200d നിയമപരമായ ഒരു വസ്തുവിനെ സ്ഥാപിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d, എല്ലാ യൂറോപ്പിക്കാര്\u200dക്കും 1300', 'mt': 'L-Ewropa hija soċjetà multilingwi, li fiha jitkellmu għexieren ta’ lingwi. L-unika għażla li tippermetti u tibbenefika mill-multilingwiżmu hija permezz tat-Teknoloġiji tal-Lingwi (LT), jiġifieri, it-Teknoloġiji tal-Ipproċessar tal-Lingwi Natural i u tal-Kellem. Aħna niddeskrivu l-Grilja Ewropea tal-Lingwi (ELG), li għandha l-għan li tevolvi fil-pjattaforma primarja u fis-suq għall-LT fl-Ewropa billi tipprovdi pjattaforma umbrella waħda għall-pajsaġġ Ewropew tal-LT, inklużi r-riċerka u l-industrija, li tippermetti lill-partijiet interessati kollha li jżidu, jaqsmu u jiddistribwixxu s-servizzi, il-prodotti u r-riżorsi tagħhom. Fl-a ħħar tal-proġett tagħna tal-UE, li se jistabbilixxi entità legali fl-2022, l-ELG se jipprovdi aċċess għal madwar 1300 servizz għall-lingwi Ewropej kollha kif ukoll eluf ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta.', 'mn': 'Европ бол олон хэл нийгэмд хэдэн хэл ярьдаг. Олон хэл хэлний технологи (LT) болон ашиг ашиглах ганц сонголт бол байгалийн хэл процесс болон ярианы технологи. Бид Европын Европын Холбоо Гридийг (ELG) тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ нь Европын LT-ийн анхны платформ болон зах зээл дээр хөгжүүлэх зорилготой. Европын LT газрын сүлжээнд нэг саван платформ өгч, судалгаа, үйлдвэрлэл, судалгаа, үйлдвэрлэл, бүх засгийн газры Европын хэл болон мянга мянга мянган мэдээллийн бүтээгдэхүүнд 1300 үйлчилгээ хангах болно.', 'pl': 'Europa jest wielojęzycznym społeczeństwem, w którym mówi się dziesiątkami języków. Jedyną opcją umożliwiającą włączenie i korzystanie z wielojęzyczności są technologie językowe (LT), tj. technologie przetwarzania języka naturalnego i technologie mowy. Opisujemy europejską sieć językową (ELG), która ma przekształcić się w główną platformę i rynek dla LT w Europie poprzez zapewnienie jednej platformy parasolowej dla europejskiego krajobrazu LT, w tym badań i przemysłu, umożliwiającej wszystkim zainteresowanym stronom przesyłanie, udostępnianie i dystrybucję swoich usług, produktów i zasobów. Po zakończeniu projektu UE, który utworzy podmiot prawny w 2022, ELG zapewni dostęp do ok. 1300 usług dla wszystkich języków europejskich oraz tysięcy zbiorów danych.', 'ro': 'Europa este o societate multilingvă, în care sunt vorbite zeci de limbi. Singura opțiune de a permite și de a beneficia de multilingvism este prin intermediul tehnologiilor lingvistice (LT), și anume procesarea limbajului natural și tehnologiilor vorbirii. Descriem Rețeaua lingvistică europeană (ELG), care vizează evoluția în platforma și piața principală pentru LT în Europa, oferind o singură platformă umbrelă pentru peisajul LT european, inclusiv pentru cercetare și industrie, permițând tuturor părților interesate să își încarce, să partajeze și să distribuie serviciile, produsele și resursele. La finalul proiectului nostru UE, care va înființa o persoană juridică în 2022, ELG va oferi acces la aproximativ 1300 de servicii pentru toate limbile europene, precum și la mii de seturi de date.', 'sr': 'Evropa je multijezičko društvo, u kojem se govore desetine jezika. Jedina mogućnost omogućiti i koristiti od multilingvista je kroz jezičke tehnologije (LT), tj. prirodne jezičke procese i govorne tehnologije. Opišemo evropsku jezičku mrežu (ELG), koja je ciljana da se razvija na osnovnu platformu i tržište za LT u Evropi pružajući jednu platformu kišobrana za europsku landskapu LT-a, uključujući istraživanje i industriju, omogućavajući svim zainteresovanim stranama da uplate, dijele i distribuciju svojih usluga, proizvoda i resursa. Na kraju našeg projekta EU, koji će uspostaviti pravnu entitetu 2022. godine, ELG će pružiti pristup oko 1300 usluga svim evropskim jezicima, kao i hiljadama seta podataka.', 'si': 'යුරෝපය තමයි බොහොම භාෂාවක් සමාජයක්, ඒ වගේම භාෂාවක් දහස් කතා කරනවා. බොහොම භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාත්මක වලින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න හා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න එකම විකල්පය තමයි භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාත්මක (LT) වලින් අපි යුරෝපිය භාෂා ග්\u200dරිඩ් (ELG) විශ්වාස කරනවා, මෙයා ඉලක්කුවෙන් LT වල ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ ව්\u200dයාපාරයෙන් විකාශය කරනවා යුරෝපිය LT වලින් ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධානය සහ ව අපේ යුරෝපිය ව්\u200dයාපෘතියේ අන්තිමේදී, ඒක 2022 දී නීතිපත්තියක් ස්ථාපනය කරයි, ELG සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශ කරන්න පුළුව', 'sv': 'Europa är ett flerspråkigt samhälle där dussintals språk talas. Det enda alternativet för att möjliggöra och dra nytta av flerspråkighet är genom språkteknik (LT), dvs. Natural Language Processing and Speech Technologies. Vi beskriver European Language Grid (ELG), som syftar till att utvecklas till den primära plattformen och marknadsplatsen för LT i Europa genom att tillhandahålla en paraplyplattform för det europeiska LT landskapet, inklusive forskning och industri, så att alla intressenter kan ladda upp, dela och distribuera sina tjänster, produkter och resurser. I slutet av vårt EU-projekt, som kommer att etablera en juridisk person 2022, kommer ELG att ge tillgång till cirka 1300 tjänster för alla europeiska språk samt tusentals datauppsättningar.', 'no': 'Europa er ein fleirspråk samfunn, der tusen språk vert snakket. Det eneste valet å slå på og få nytte frå multilingualism er gjennom språk-teknologi (LT), t.d. naturleg språk-handtering og språk-teknologi. Vi beskriver den europeiske språkkrutenettet (ELG), som er målet å utvikla i det primære plattformet og markedsplassen for LT i Europa ved å gi eit umbrella plattform for den europeiske LT landskapen, inkludert forskning og industrien, og at alle stakeholder kan lasta opp, dele og distribuera tenesta, produktar og ressursar sine. På slutten av EU-prosjektet vårt, som vil oppretta ein rett entitet i 2022, vil ELG gi tilgang til nærare 1300 tenester for alle europeiske språk og tusenvis av datasett.', 'ta': 'Europe is a multilingual society, in which dozens of languages are spoken.  பல மொழிகளிலிருந்து செயல்படுத்த மற்றும் பயன்படுத்த விருப்பத்தேர்வு மட்டுமே மொழி தொழில்நுட்பம் (LT), அதாவது, இயல்பான மொழி செயல்படுத்தல நாம் ஐரோப்பிய மொழி கட்டத்தை விவரிக்கிறோம். இது ஐரோப்பிய முதன்மைய தளங்கள் மற்றும் சந்தையில் மாற்றுவதற்கு எதிர்பார்க்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, ஐரோப்பிய LT நிலத்திற்கான ஒரு அளபுல்லா தளப்படி வழங் எங்கள் யூரோப்பிய திட்டத்தின் முடிவில், அது 2022 ல் ஒரு சட்ட பொருளை உருவாக்கும், ELG அனைத்து ஐரோப்பிய மொழிகளுக்கும் 1300 சேவைகளும்', 'ur': 'اروپا ایک بہت سی زبان اجتماعی ہے جہاں دوسری زبانیں بولتی ہیں۔ بہت سی زبان تکنولوژی (LT) کے ذریعے اور فائدہ پہنچانے کے لئے صرف ایک اختیار ہے۔ ہم اروپای زبان گرید (ELG) کو توصیح دیتے ہیں، جس کا اروپا میں LT کے لئے پہلی پلٹورم اور مارکیٹ مکان میں تغییر کرنے کا موقع ہے، یورپای LT منظور کے لئے ایک امبرل پلٹورم کے ذریعہ، تحقیق اور صنعت کے شامل، تمام منظور داروں کو آلپ، شریک اور تقسیم کرنے کے لئے اجازت دیتے ہیں۔ ہمارے اروپا پروژے کے آخر میں، جو 2022 میں ایک قانونی ایٹنسیٹ پیدا کرے گا، ELG تقریباً تقریباً حاصل کرے گا.', 'so': 'Yurub waa bulsho luuqado kala duduwan, kuwaas oo lagu hadlo kuman luuqadood. Waxbarashada luuqadaha kala duduwan oo kaliya waxaa lagu sameeyaa teknolojiyada luqada (LT), tusaale ahaan baaritaanka afka asalka ah iyo hadalka. Waxaannu tilmaamaynaa xarunta afka Yurub (ELG), kaas oo loogu talogalay in loo horumariyo koorsiga iyo suuqa ugu horeysa ee Yurub laga sameeyo suuqa LT ee Yurub, kuwaas oo ka mid ah baaraandegista iyo ganacsiga Yurub, kuwaas oo awood u yeelan karta in dhammaan qofka suuqa ah ay kor u qaadaan, qaybsadaan adeegyadooda, alaabta iyo hantida. Marka uu dhamaado shirkadeena Midowga Yurub, kaas oo aasaasi kara jidh sharciga ah 2022, ELG wuxuu heli doonaa adeegyada aad u heli karto qiyaastii 1300 luuqadaha Yurub oo dhan iyo kumanyaalka sawirada.', 'uz': "Oyropa bir necha tillar jamiyasi, bu yerda ko'plab tillar gapiradi. Ko'proq tildan foydalanish va foydalanish uchun faqat til teknologiya (LT), balki tabiiy tilni taʼminlovchi va gapirish teknologiya orqali. We describe the European Language Grid (ELG), which is targeted to evolve into the primary platform and marketplace for LT in Europe by providing one umbrella platform for the European LT landscape, including research and industry, enabling all stakeholders to upload, share and distribute their services, products and resources.  2022 yilda qoidagi ijodkorlik tizimini ishga tushiriladigan EU loyihasimiz oxirida, ELG hamma yevropacha 1300 xizmatlar va minglab maʼlumot tizimlarini qo'llaydi.", 'vi': 'Châu Âu là một xã hội đa dạng, trong đó có cả tá ngôn ngữ. Cách duy nhất để bật và hưởng lợi từ tiếng chuông là thông qua Ngôn ngữ (LT), tức là xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên và công nghệ Ngôn ngữ. Chúng tôi mô tả hệ thống ngôn ngữ Châu Âu (LOG), mục tiêu phát triển thành nền tảng và chợ chính cho LT ở Châu Âu bằng cách cung cấp một nền tảng lớn cho lãnh thổ LT, bao gồm cả ngành nghiên cứu và công nghiệp, để mọi người có thể tải lên, chia sẻ và phân phát dịch vụ, sản phẩm và nguồn lực của họ. Khi kết thúc dự án của chúng ta, nó sẽ thành lập một thực thể hợp pháp ở 2022, nhờ có một nguồn điện giao dịch vụ A. 1300 cho tất cả các ngôn ngữ Châu Âu và hàng ngàn bộ dữ liệu.', 'bg': 'Европа е многоезично общество, в което се говорят десетки езици. Единственият вариант да се даде възможност и да се възползва от многоезичието е чрез езикови технологии (LT), т.е. естествени езикови технологии и говорови технологии. Описваме европейската езикова мрежа (ЕЛГ), която е насочена да се превърне в основна платформа и пазар за езикова литература в Европа, като предоставя една обща платформа за европейския ландшафт на езиковата литература, включително научните изследвания и индустрията, позволявайки на всички заинтересовани страни да качват, споделят и разпространяват своите услуги, продукти и ресурси. В края на проекта ни за ЕС, който ще създаде юридическо лице през 2022 г., ЕЛГ ще предостави достъп до около 1300 услуги за всички европейски езици, както и до хиляди набори от данни.', 'da': 'Europa er et flersproget samfund, hvor der tales snesevis af sprog. Den eneste mulighed for at aktivere og drage fordel af flersprogethed er ved hjælp af sprogteknologier (LT), dvs. Natural Language Processing and Speech Technologies. Vi beskriver det europæiske sprognet (ELG), som har til formål at udvikle sig til den primære platform og markedsplads for LT i Europa ved at tilbyde én paraplyplatform for det europæiske LT landskab, herunder forskning og industri, så alle interessenter kan uploade, dele og distribuere deres tjenester, produkter og ressourcer. Ved afslutningen af vores EU-projekt, som skal etablere en juridisk enhed i 2022, vil ELG give adgang til ca. 1300 tjenester for alle europæiske sprog samt tusindvis af datasæt.', 'nl': 'Europa is een meertalige samenleving, waarin tientallen talen worden gesproken. De enige optie om meertaligheid mogelijk te maken en ervan te profiteren is door middel van taaltechnologieën (LT), dat wil zeggen natuurlijke taalverwerking en spraaktechnologieën. We beschrijven het European Language Grid (ELG), dat bedoeld is om te evolueren tot het primaire platform en marktplaats voor LT in Europa door één overkoepelend platform te bieden voor het Europese LT-landschap, inclusief onderzoek en industrie, waardoor alle belanghebbenden hun diensten, producten en bronnen kunnen uploaden, delen en distribueren. Aan het einde van ons EU-project, dat in 2022 een rechtspersoon zal oprichten, zal de ELG toegang bieden tot ca. 1300 diensten voor alle Europese talen en duizenden datasets.', 'hr': 'Evropa je multijezičko društvo, u kojem se govore desetine jezika. Jedina mogućnost omogućiti i koristiti od multilingvista je kroz jezičke tehnologije (LT), tj. prirodne jezičke procese i govorne tehnologije. Mi opisujemo europsku jezičku mrežu (ELG), koja je ciljana da se razvija na osnovnu platformu i tržište LT-a u Europi pružajući jednu platformu kišobrana za europsku landskapu LT-a, uključujući istraživanje i industriju, omogućavajući svim dionicima da postave, dijele i raspodjele svoje usluge, proizvode i resurse. Na kraju našeg projekta EU-a, koji će uspostaviti pravnu subjektu 2022. godine, ELG će omogućiti pristup približnom broju 1300 usluga za sve europske jezike, kao i tisuće setova podataka.', 'de': 'Europa ist eine mehrsprachige Gesellschaft, in der Dutzende von Sprachen gesprochen werden. Die einzige Möglichkeit, Mehrsprachigkeit zu aktivieren und von ihr zu profitieren, ist Sprachtechnologien (LT), d.h. natürliche Sprachverarbeitung und Sprachtechnologien. Wir beschreiben das European Language Grid (ELG), das sich zur primären Plattform und Marktplatz für LT in Europa entwickeln soll, indem es eine Dachplattform für die europäische LT-Landschaft einschließlich Forschung und Industrie bereitstellt, die es allen Beteiligten ermöglicht, ihre Dienstleistungen, Produkte und Ressourcen hochzuladen, zu teilen und zu verteilen. Am Ende unseres EU-Projekts, das in 2022 eine juristische Person gründen wird, wird die ELG Zugang zu ca. 1300-Diensten für alle europäischen Sprachen sowie Tausenden von Datensätzen bieten.', 'ko': '유럽은 여러 언어의 사회로 몇 십 가지 언어가 있다.다양한 언어를 구현해 혜택을 볼 수 있는 유일한 선택은 언어기술(LT), 즉 자연언어처리와 음성기술을 통한 것이다.우리는 유럽 언어 격자(ELG)를 묘사했는데 그 목표는 유럽 LT 분야(연구와 공업 포함)에 우산식 플랫폼을 제공함으로써 모든 이해관계자가 그들의 서비스, 제품과 자원을 업로드하고 공유하며 나누어 유럽 LT의 주요 플랫폼과 시장으로 발전시키는 것이다.우리의 EU 프로젝트는 2022년에 법률 실체를 설립하여 이 프로젝트가 끝날 때 ELG는 모든 유럽 언어에 약 1300개의 서비스와 수천 개의 데이터 집합을 제공할 것이다.', 'id': 'Eropa adalah masyarakat berbilang bahasa, di mana lusinan bahasa dibicarakan. Satu-satunya pilihan untuk memungkinkan dan menguntungkan multibahasa adalah melalui Teknologi Bahasa (LT), i.e., Proses Bahasa Alami dan Teknologi Bicara. Kami menggambarkan Jaringan Bahasa Eropa (ELG), yang ditujukan untuk berevolusi ke platform utama dan pasar LT di Eropa dengan menyediakan satu platform payung untuk tanaman LT Eropa, termasuk penelitian dan industri, memungkinkan semua pihak berwenang untuk mengunggah, berbagi dan mendistribusikan layanan, produk dan sumber daya mereka. Pada akhir proyek EU kami, yang akan mendirikan entitas hukum pada tahun 2022, ELG akan menyediakan akses ke sekitar 1300 layanan untuk semua bahasa Eropa dan ribuan set data.', 'sw': 'Ulaya ni jamii ya lugha nyingi, ambazo maelfu ya lugha zinazungumzwa. Chaguo pekee cha kuwezesha na kunufaika kutoka lugha mbalimbali ni kupitia teknolojia ya lugha (LT), yaani, Utafiti wa lugha za asili na Uzungumzaji. Tunaelezea Kituo cha Lugha ya Ulaya (ELG), ambacho kinalenga kuendelea katika jukwaa la msingi na soko la LT nchini Ulaya kwa kutoa jukwaa moja la jumla kwa ajili ya ardhi ya Umoja wa Ulaya, ikiwa ni pamoja na utafiti na viwanda, na kuwawezesha watumiaji wote kupandisha, kushirikisha na kusambaza huduma, bidhaa na rasilimali zao. Mwishoni mwa mradi wetu wa Umoja wa Ulaya, ambao utatengeneza taasisi ya kisheria mwaka 2022, ELG itatoa huduma ya kupata takribani. Huduma ya lugha 1300 za Ulaya pamoja na maelfu ya seti za data.', 'sq': 'Evropa është një shoqëri shumëgjuhëse në të cilën flasin dhjetra gjuhësh. The only option to enable and to benefit from multilingualism is through Language Technologies (LT), i.e., Natural Language Processing and Speech Technologies.  Ne e përshkruajmë Grilin Evropian të Gjuhave (ELG), i cili synon të zhvillohet në platform ën kryesore dhe tregun për LT në Evropë duke ofruar një platformë paraprake për peisazhin evropian të LT, duke përfshirë kërkimin dhe industrinë, duke i lejuar të gjitha palëpunëtorët të ngarkojnë, ndajnë dhe shpërndajnë shërbimet, prodhimet dhe burimet e tyre. Në fund të projektit tonë të BE, i cili do të krijojë një njësi ligjore më 2022, ELG do të ofrojë akses në rreth 1300 shërbime për të gjitha gjuhët evropiane si dhe mijëra grupe të dhënash.', 'am': 'አውሮፓ ብዙ ቋንቋዎች የሚናገሩበት ማኅበረሰብ ነው፡፡ በብዙ ቋንቋዎች ላይ ለማስችል እና ለመጠቀም የሚቻለው አንድ ምርጫው በቋንቋ ቴክኖሎጂ (LT), ምሳሌ፣ የዳርቻዊ ቋንቋ ፕሮግራም እና ንግግር ቴክሎጂ ነው፡፡ የአውሮፓውያን የኢትዮጵያ መሬት እና የኢትዮጵያ መሬት እና የኢትዮጵያ መደገፊያ ግንኙነት እና የኢትዮጵያ ግንኙነትን እና ትምህርት እና ጉዳዮች ሁሉ በመጫን፣ አገልግሎታቸውን፣ ፍሬዎችን እና ሀብትን ለመካፈል እና መክፈት የሚችሉትን የአፍሪካ ቋንቋ ግንኙነት (ELG) እናሳውቃለን፡፡ At the end of our EU project, which will establish a legal entity in 2022, the ELG will provide access to approx. 1300 services for all European languages as well as thousands of data sets.', 'hy': 'Եվրոպան բազլեզու հասարակություն է, որտեղ տասնյակ լեզուներ են խոսում: Միակ տարբերակը, որը հնարավորություն է տալիս բազմալեզվությունը և օգտագործում է դրանից, լեզվի տեխնոլոգիաների (LT) միջոցով է, այսինքն՝ բնական լեզվի վերլուծության և խոսքի տեխնոլոգիաների միջոցով է: Մենք նկարագրում ենք Եվրոպական լեզվի ցանցը (ELG), որը նպատակն է զարգանալ Եվրոպայում LT-ի հիմնական հարթակի և շուկայի միջոցով՝ տրամադրելով Եվրոպական LT-ի բնապատկերի համար մեկ պարանջային հարթակի, ներառյալ հետազոտություններ և արդյունաբերություն, թույլ տալով բոլոր հետաքրքրքրված մասնա At the end of our EU project, which will establish a legal entity in 2022, the ELG will provide access to approx. 1300 services for all European languages as well as thousands of data sets.', 'az': "Avropa √ßoxlu dil toplamńĪdńĪr, orada onlardan √ßox dil danńĪŇüńĪr. √áoxlu dil teknolojil…ôri (LT) il…ô f…ôaliyy…ôt v…ô fayda verm…ôk t…ôk se√ßimi, m…ôs…ôl…ôn, t…ôbi…ôtli dil i Ňül…ôm…ôsi v…ô dil teknolojil…ôri il…ô istifad…ô etm…ôkdir. Biz Avropa dili Grid (ELG) il…ô t…ôsbiq edirik, ki, Avropa'da LT √ľ√ß√ľn ilk platformaya v…ô marketin…ô t…ôdbiq edilmiŇüdir, Avropa LT t…ôdbiqi il…ô araŇütńĪrma v…ô end√ľstri il…ô birlikd…ô bir k√∂m…ôk platformu t…ôklif ed…ôr…ôk, b√ľt√ľn iŇütirak√ßńĪlarńĪn hizm…ôtl…ôrini, √ľr…ôkl…ôrini v…ô resurslarńĪnńĪ y√ľkl…ôm…ôsin…ô, paylaŇüńĪb dańüńĪtmasńĪnńĪ v…ô s…ô AB proyektimizin sonunda, 2022-ci ild…ô yasal bir entit…ô t…ôyin ed…ôc…ôk, ELG yaxńĪnlaŇüdńĪracaq. B√ľt√ľn Avropa dill…ôrinin v…ô min m…ôlumat qurmaqlarńĪnńĪn 1300 hizm…ôtl…ôrini t…ômin ed…ôc…ôk.", 'tr': 'Ýewropa köp dilli jemgyýetdir. Olaryň içinde näçe sany diller gepleýär. Çoklu dil teknolojileri (LT) bilen mümkin etmek we fayda vermek üçin diňe bir seçenek, meselâ, tebigy dil i şlemegi we dil teknolojileri bilen dir. Ýewropa dil Grid äni (ELG) tassykladyryp görýäris, bu ýerde LT üçin prinsip platforma we bazarlyk üçin Ewropada ýeke saýat platforma paýlaşyp, araştyrma we senagat bilen, ähli möhüm bolanlaryň häzirki häzirlerini ýüklemegi, paýlaşmak we jemgyýetlerini, önümleriň we çeşmelerini paýlaşmak üçin AB projemiziň soňunda, 2022-nji ýylda yasal taýýarlanmasy üçin ELG golaýlaşýar. Tüm Avrupa dilleriň we müňlerçe bergi setirleriniň üçin 1300 hızmeti berir.', 'af': "Europa is 'n multitaalse samelewing waarin duisende tale praat word. Die enigste opsie om te aktiveer en te voorspoedig van multilingualism is deur Taal Teknologies (LT), t.d. Natuurlike Taal Prosessering en Spraak Teknologies. Ons beskryf die Europeese Taal Grid (ELG), wat die doel is om in die primêre platforma en markplek vir LT in Europa te ontwikkel deur een umbrella platforma vir die Europeese LT landskap te verskaf, insluitend verkenning en industrie, wat alle geinteressante houers kan oplaai, deel en verdeel hul dienste, produkte en hulpbronne. By die einde van ons EU-projek, wat in 2022 'n wetlike entiteit sal instelling, sal die ELG toegang tot aankoms verskaf. 1300 dienste vir alle Europeese tale en duisende datastelle.", 'fa': 'اروپا یک جامعه بسیاری زبان است که در آن دو دهه زبان صحبت می\u200cشود. تنها گزینه برای توانایی و سودمندی از بسیاری زبان\u200cشناسی از طریق تکنولوژی زبان (LT) است، یعنی پرداخت زبان طبیعی و تکنولوژی سخنرانی. ما گرید زبان اروپایی (ELG) را توصیف می\u200cکنیم که هدف می\u200cگیرد تا به عنوان برنامه اصلی و بازارگاه LT در اروپا تغییر دهد، با یک Plataform umbrella برای منطقه LT اروپایی، شامل تحقیقات و صنعت، که می\u200cتواند تمام کارگران را به آلپ، تقسیم و تقسیم خدمات، محصولات و منابع خود در پایان پروژه اروپا ما، که در سال ۲۰۱۲ یک entity قانونی ایجاد خواهد کرد، ELG دسترسی به نزدیک است. ۱۳۰ خدمات برای همه زبان اروپا و هزاران مجموعه داده خواهد داد.', 'bn': 'ইউরোপ একটি বহুভাষার সমাজ, যেখানে ডজন ভাষা কথা বলে। মাল্টিভুয়ালিজম থেকে সক্রিয় এবং সুবিধা প্রদানের একমাত্র অপশন হল ভাষা প্রযুক্তির মাধ্যমে (এলটি), যেমন প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া এবং  We describe the European Language Grid (ELG), which is targeted to evolve into the primary platform and marketplace for LT in Europe by providing one umbrella platform for the European LT landscape, including research and industry, enabling all stakeholders to upload, share and distribute their services, products and resources.  আমাদের ইউরোপিয়ান প্রকল্পের শেষ পর্যন্ত, যা ২০২২ সালে একটি আইনগত বস্তুতে প্রতিষ্ঠান করবে, ইলজি প্রায় ১৩০০ জন ইউরোপীয় ভাষায় প্রবেশ করতে পা', 'bs': 'Evropa je multijezičko društvo, u kojem se govore desetine jezika. Jedina mogućnost omogućiti i koristiti od multilingvista je kroz jezičke tehnologije (LT), tj. prirodne jezičke procese i govorne tehnologije. Opisujemo evropsku jezičku mrežu (ELG), koja je ciljana da se razvija na osnovnu platformu i tržište za LT u Evropi pružajući jednu platformu kišobrana za europsku landskapu LT-a, uključujući istraživanje i industriju, omogućavajući svim zainteresovanim stranama da postave, dijele i distribuciju svojih usluga, proizvoda i resursa. Na kraju našeg projekta EU-a, koji će uspostaviti pravnu entitetu 2022. godine, ELG će omogućiti pristup oko 1300 usluga svim evropskim jezicima, kao i hiljade seta podataka.', 'ca': "Europa és una societat multillengua, en la qual es parlan dotzenes de llengües. L'única opció que permet i beneficia del multilingüisme és mitjançant les tecnologies lingüístices (LT), és a dir, les tecnologies de processament de llenguatges naturals i de discurs. Descrivem la Red Europea de Llingues (ELG), que té l'objectiu d'evolucionar cap a la plataforma primària i el mercat de LT a Europa proporcionant una plataforma paral·lela al paisatge europeu de LT, incloent la investigació i la indústria, que permet a totes les partes interessats carregar, compartir i distribuir els seus serveis, productes i recursos. Al final del nostre projecte de la UE, que crearà una entitat legal al 2022, l'ELG proporcionarà accés a aproximadament 1300 serveis per a totes les llengües europees i milers de conjunts de dades.", 'cs': 'Evropa je mnohojazyčná společnost, ve které se mluví desítkami jazyků. Jedinou možností, jak umožnit a využívat vícejazyčnost, je prostřednictvím jazykových technologií (LT), tj. zpracování přirozeného jazyka a technologie řeči. Popisujeme evropskou jazykovou síť (ELG), jejímž cílem je vyvinout se na primární platformu a trh pro LT v Evropě poskytováním jedné střešní platformy pro evropskou LT krajinu, včetně výzkumu a průmyslu, která umožňuje všem zúčastněným stranám nahrávat, sdílet a distribuovat své služby, produkty a zdroje. Na konci našeho projektu EU, který založí právnickou osobu ve 2022, bude ELG poskytovat přístup ke službám cca 1300 pro všechny evropské jazyky a tisícům datových sad.', 'et': 'Euroopa on mitmekeelne ühiskond, kus räägitakse kümneid keeli. Ainus võimalus mitmekeelsuse võimaldamiseks ja sellest kasu saamiseks on keeltehnoloogia (LT), st loodusliku keele töötlemise ja kõnetehnoloogia kaudu. Kirjeldame Euroopa keelevõrku (ELG), mille eesmärk on areneda Euroopa keelte peamiseks platvormiks ja turuks, pakkudes Euroopa keelte maastikule ühe katusplatvormi, sealhulgas teadusuuringute ja tööstuse jaoks, mis võimaldab kõigil sidusrühmadel oma teenuseid, tooteid ja ressursse üles laadida, jagada ja levitada. ELi projekti lõpus, mis loob juriidilise isiku 2022. aastal, pakub ELG ligikaudu 1300 teenust kõigile Euroopa keeltele ja tuhandetele andmekogumitele.', 'fi': 'Eurooppa on monikielinen yhteiskunta, jossa puhutaan kymmeniä kieliä. Ainoa vaihtoehto monikielisyyden mahdollistamiseksi ja hyödyntämiseksi on Language Technologies (LT), eli luonnollisen kielen käsittely ja puhetekniikka. Kuvaamme eurooppalaista kieliverkkoa (ELG), jonka tavoitteena on kehittyä Euroopan kirjallisuuden ensisijaiseksi foorumiksi ja markkinapaikaksi tarjoamalla yksi kattofoorumi Euroopan kirjallisuuden maisemalle, mukaan lukien tutkimus ja teollisuus, jonka avulla kaikki sidosryhmät voivat ladata, jakaa ja jakaa palveluitaan, tuotteitaan ja resurssejaan. Vuonna 2022 perustetun EU-hankkeen päätteeksi ELG tarjoaa käyttöönsä noin 1300 palvelua kaikilla eurooppalaisilla kielillä sekä tuhansia datakokonaisuuksia.', 'sk': 'Evropa je večjezična družba, v kateri se govori na desetine jezikov. Edina možnost za omogočanje in izkoriščanje večjezičnosti je jezikovna tehnologija (LT), tj. obdelava naravnega jezika in govorna tehnologija. Opisujemo evropsko jezikovno mrežo (ELG), katere cilj je razvoj v primarno platformo in trg za LT v Evropi z zagotavljanjem ene krovne platforme za evropsko LT krajino, vključno z raziskavami in industrijo, ki vsem zainteresiranim stranem omogoča nalaganje, delitev in distribucijo svojih storitev, izdelkov in virov. Ob koncu projekta EU, ki bo leta 2022 ustanovil pravno osebo, bo ELG zagotovila dostop do približno 1300 storitev za vse evropske jezike in tisoče podatkovnih nizov.', 'jv': 'Yuroti kanggo wong liya sing sampeyan bangkat sabanjuré, ning awak dhéwé uga luwih basa. Pilihan sing wis dipunangé karo ibukno kanggo nggambar kelangan liyane luwih (LT), dadi, sak Jabun Perusahaan lan Teknêlogi Perusahaan kanggo Kebebasan Awak dhéwé rakèh sabané Grid lan luwih dumadhi kayéwé nggawe ngubah ing sakjane kanggo ngilangno sistem sing nyebuté nggawe LT ing nggawe sistem sistem sing berarti kanggo kaluwargane LT ning berarti LT sing dumadhi, gambar nggawe barang-sistem lan ingkang sampek, iso nggawe kabèh sak cara-sak sing berarti, iso nggawe akeh podho,  Finger sampeyan proyek UE, sing paling nggawe aturan hukum kanggo nggawe cadang sing dimulai, nggawe barang nggawe aturan kanggo kowé urip kanggo Kemerdekaan kanggo Kemerdekaan kanggo Kemerdekaan kanggo Kemerdekaan kanggo Kemerdekaan kanggo Kemerdekaan kanggo Kemerdekaan', 'ha': "Yurubi yana da jami masu mulki, a cikinsu akwai wasu harshe dubu. Daidaita ɗabi'a da za'a fara da amfani da daga masu cikin harshen turanci, yana ƙarami Technical na Lugha (LT), misali, Tafiyar da Akwai da Fasalo'in da ake faɗa. Tuna bayyana shirin Lugha na Yurubi (ELG), wanda aka yi nufin su cire ta a farkon platform da suuɗar LT na Yaura da kuma a wajen iyarwa da shirin LT a kasar EURopa, da kuma a sami wata platform wa wurãren LT, kamar shirin karatun da masu kashẽwa, su sami dukkan mataimaka, da kuma su raba huduma. Ga ƙarshen shirin ayukan ELG, wanda zai iya samar da wani masu sharia a shekara 2022, ELG zai iya iya iya amfani da abincin kowace. 130 huduma cikin lugha Ewropa da dubu zalumai.", 'he': 'אירופה היא חברה רבת שפות, שבה מדברים עשרות שפות. האפשרות היחידה לאפשר ולהרוויח מהרבות שפות היא דרך טכנולוגיות שפות (LT), כלומר, טכנולוגיות מעבדת שפות טבעיות וטכנולוגיות דיבור. אנחנו מתארים את רשת השפה האירופאית (ELG), שמטרה להתפתח לפלטפורמה העיקרית והשווק של LT באירופה על ידי סיפקת פלטפורמה מטרית אחת לנוף LT האירופאי, כולל מחקר ותעשייה, מאפשרת לכל התעניינים להעלות, לחלוק ולפיזר את שירותיהם, המוצרים ומשאבים. בסוף פרויקט האירופאי שלנו, אשר ייקם ישות משפטית בשנת 2022, ELG יספק גישה ל-1300 שירותים לכל שפות אירופאיות כמו גם אלפי קבוצות נתונים.', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ན། དེ་ནང་དུ་སྐད་རིགས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་གདམ་ཀ་གཅིག་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་སྒེར་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་དང་། དེ་ལ་དམིགས་འདོགས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཡུ་ཨར་པོའི་ནང་གི་LT སྟོང་དང་ཐོག་ཁུངས་ནང་དུ་LT སྟོང་ཆོག་གཅིག་གི་གླེང་སྒྲམ་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་མཁན་གཙོ་བོ་དང་།  2022 ལོའི་མཇུག་དུ་ང་ཚོའི་དབུས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཅིག་སྒྲིག་ཆགས་པ་དེ་ལས་ ELG་གིས་ཉེ་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ཉེ་གནས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་རྒྱུ་དང་།'}
{'en': 'A New Surprise Measure for Extracting Interesting Relationships between Persons', 'ar': 'إجراء مفاجئ جديد لاستخراج العلاقات الممتعة بين الأشخاص', 'es': 'Una nueva medida sorpresa para extraer relaciones interesantes entre las personas', 'pt': 'Uma nova medida surpresa para extrair relacionamentos interessantes entre pessoas', 'fr': 'Une nouvelle mesure surprise pour extraire des relations intéressantes entre les personnes', 'zh': '提取人间新惊喜', 'ja': '人と人との興味深い関係を引き出すための新たなサプライズ対策', 'hi': 'व्यक्तियों के बीच दिलचस्प संबंधों को निकालने के लिए एक नया आश्चर्य उपाय', 'ru': 'Новая неожиданная мера для извлечения интересных отношений между людьми', 'ga': 'Beart Iontais Nua Chun Caidreamh Suimiúil a Bhaint as Daoine', 'hu': 'Új meglepetési intézkedés a személyek közötti érdekes kapcsolatok kibontására', 'it': 'Una nuova misura a sorpresa per estrarre relazioni interessanti tra persone', 'kk': 'Name', 'mk': 'A New Surprise Measure for Extracting Interesting Relationships between Persons', 'lt': 'Nauja stebuklinga priemonė, skirta asmenų interesingų santykių ištraukimui', 'ka': 'Name', 'ms': 'Tindakan Kejutan Baru untuk Ekstrak Hubungan Menarik diantara Orang', 'ml': 'വ്യക്തികള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള ആശ്വാസബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു പുതിയ പരിപാടി അളവു്', 'no': 'Name', 'mt': 'Miżura Ġdida ta’ Sorveljanza għall-Estrazzjoni tar-Relazzjonijiet Interessanti bejn il-Persuni', 'mn': 'Хүмүүсийн хоорондын сонирхолтой харилцааныг татах шинэ гайхамшигтай хэмжээ', 'ro': 'O nouă măsură surpriză pentru extragerea relațiilor interesante dintre persoane', 'pl': 'Nowy środek niespodzianki do wydobycia ciekawych relacji między osobami', 'el': 'Ένα νέο μέτρο έκπληξης για την εξαγωγή ενδιαφέρουσων σχέσεων μεταξύ προσώπων', 'sr': 'Nova iznenađenja mjera za izvlačenje zanimljivih odnosa između osoba', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'En ny överraskningsåtgärd för att utvinna intressanta relationer mellan personer', 'ta': 'புதிய ஆச்சரியம் அளவு', 'ur': 'Name', 'so': 'Heymiska shirkadda cusub ee la soo saaro xiriirka Interessa', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một biện pháp phục vụ mới cho việc chiết xuất mối quan hệ thú vị giữa người', 'bg': 'Нова изненадваща мярка за извличане на интересни отношения между лица', 'hr': 'Nova mjera iznenađenja za izvlačenje zanimljivih odnosa između osoba', 'da': 'En ny overraskelsesforanstaltning til at udtrække interessante relationer mellem personer', 'id': 'Tindakan Kejutan Baru untuk Ekstraksi Hubungan Menarik antara Orang', 'de': 'Eine neue Überraschungsmaßnahme zur Extraktion interessanter Beziehungen zwischen Personen', 'sw': 'Hatua mpya ya Surprise kwa Kutoa uhusiano wa kusisimua kati ya watu', 'nl': 'Een nieuwe verrassingsmaatregel voor het extraheren van interessante relaties tussen personen', 'ko': '사람과 사람 사이의 흥미로운 관계를 추출하는 새로운 기쁨의 측정', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një masë e re surprizë për nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve interesante midis personave', 'fa': 'یک اندازه سورپرایز جدید برای اخراج رابطه های جالبی بین افراد', 'am': 'አዲስ የውጤት መድረክ ማውጣት', 'hy': 'Մարդկանց միջև հետաքրքիր հարաբերությունների հանելու համար նոր զարմանալի միջոց', 'bs': 'Nova mjera iznenađenja za izvlačenje zanimljivih odnosa između osoba', 'bn': 'ব্যক্তিদের মধ্যে কৌতূহলজনক সম্পর্ক বের করার জন্য একটি নতুন বিস্ময়কর মাপ', 'cs': 'Nové překvapivé opatření pro extrakci zajímavých vztahů mezi osobami', 'az': 'İnsanların arasındakı ilginç ilişkisini çıxartmaq üçün yeni təəccüblü ölçü', 'et': 'Uus üllatusmeetme huvitavate suhete väljavõtmiseks isikute vahel', 'fi': 'Uusi yllätystoimenpide ihmisten välisten kiinnostavien suhteiden purkamiseksi', 'ca': 'Una nova mesura de sorpresa per extraure relacions interessants entre persones', 'tr': 'Adamlar arasynda gyzyklanç ilişkileri açmak üçin täze bir hyýap ölçüsi', 'jv': 'Peringatus Barisah kanggo Kebebasan Rusak nggo Kemerdekaan Rusak', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Nov ukrep presenečenja za odkrivanje zanimivih odnosov med osebami', 'bo': 'མི་དང་དབར་སྐྱེལ་བའི་འབྲེལ་བ་ཕྱིར་འདོན་པར་བརྗོད་མཁན་གསར་བ་ཞིག་གི་ཚད་གཞུང་སྐྱེས་ཚད།', 'he': 'אמצע הפתעה חדש להוציא מערכות יחסים מעניינות בין אנשים'}
{'en': 'One way to enhance user engagement in search engines is to suggest interesting facts to the user. Although relationships between persons are important as a target for text mining, there are few effective approaches for extracting the interesting relationships between persons. We therefore propose a method for extracting interesting relationships between persons from natural language texts by focusing on their surprisingness. Our method first extracts all personal relationships from dependency trees for the texts and then calculates surprise scores for distributed representations of the extracted relationships in an unsupervised manner. The unique point of our method is that it does not require any labeled dataset with annotation for the surprising personal relationships. The results of the human evaluation show that the proposed method could extract more interesting relationships between persons from Japanese Wikipedia articles than a popularity-based baseline method. We demonstrate our proposed method as a chrome plugin on google search.', 'ar': 'تتمثل إحدى طرق تحسين مشاركة المستخدم في محركات البحث في اقتراح حقائق مثيرة للاهتمام للمستخدم. على الرغم من أهمية العلاقات بين الأشخاص كهدف للتنقيب عن النص ، إلا أن هناك عددًا قليلاً من الأساليب الفعالة لاستخراج العلاقات المثيرة للاهتمام بين الأشخاص. لذلك نقترح طريقة لاستخراج العلاقات الممتعة بين الأشخاص من نصوص اللغة الطبيعية من خلال التركيز على دهشتهم. تستخرج طريقتنا أولاً جميع العلاقات الشخصية من أشجار التبعية للنصوص ثم تحسب الدرجات المفاجئة للتمثيلات الموزعة للعلاقات المستخرجة بطريقة غير خاضعة للإشراف. النقطة الفريدة في طريقتنا هي أنها لا تتطلب أي مجموعة بيانات مصنفة مع شرح توضيحي للعلاقات الشخصية المدهشة. تظهر نتائج التقييم البشري أن الطريقة المقترحة يمكن أن تستخلص علاقات أكثر إثارة للاهتمام بين الأشخاص من مقالات ويكيبيديا اليابانية أكثر من طريقة خط الأساس القائمة على الشعبية. نوضح طريقتنا المقترحة كمكوِّن إضافي لـ Chrome في بحث Google.', 'es': 'Una forma de mejorar la participación de los usuarios en los motores de búsqueda es sugerir datos interesantes al usuario. Aunque las relaciones entre las personas son importantes como objetivo para la minería de textos, hay pocos enfoques efectivos para extraer las interesantes relaciones entre las personas. Por lo tanto, proponemos un método para extraer relaciones interesantes entre personas a partir de textos en lenguaje natural, centrándose en su sorpresa. Nuestro método primero extrae todas las relaciones personales de los árboles de dependencia para los textos y luego calcula las puntuaciones sorpresa para las representaciones distribuidas de las relaciones extraídas de una manera no supervisada. El punto único de nuestro método es que no requiere ningún conjunto de datos etiquetado con anotaciones para las sorprendentes relaciones personales. Los resultados de la evaluación humana muestran que el método propuesto podría extraer relaciones más interesantes entre personas de los artículos de Wikipedia en japonés que un método de referencia basado en la popularidad. Demostramos nuestro método propuesto como un complemento de Chrome en la búsqueda de Google.', 'pt': 'Uma forma de aumentar o engajamento do usuário nos mecanismos de busca é sugerir fatos interessantes ao usuário. Embora os relacionamentos entre pessoas sejam importantes como alvo para mineração de texto, existem poucas abordagens eficazes para extrair os relacionamentos interessantes entre pessoas. Propomos, portanto, um método para extrair relações interessantes entre pessoas a partir de textos em linguagem natural, focando em sua surpresa. Nosso método primeiro extrai todos os relacionamentos pessoais das árvores de dependência para os textos e, em seguida, calcula pontuações surpresa para representações distribuídas dos relacionamentos extraídos de maneira não supervisionada. O ponto único do nosso método é que ele não requer nenhum conjunto de dados rotulado com anotação para os relacionamentos pessoais surpreendentes. Os resultados da avaliação humana mostram que o método proposto pode extrair relações mais interessantes entre pessoas de artigos japoneses da Wikipédia do que um método de linha de base baseado em popularidade. Demonstramos nosso método proposto como um plugin do chrome na pesquisa do google.', 'fr': "Un moyen d'améliorer l'engagement des utilisateurs dans les moteurs de recherche consiste à suggérer des faits intéressants à l'utilisateur. Bien que les relations entre personnes constituent une cible importante pour l'exploration de texte, il existe peu d'approches efficaces pour extraire les relations intéressantes entre les personnes. Nous proposons donc une méthode pour extraire des relations intéressantes entre des personnes à partir de textes en langage naturel en mettant l'accent sur leur caractère surprenant. Notre méthode extrait d'abord toutes les relations personnelles des arbres de dépendance pour les textes, puis calcule des scores surprises pour des représentations distribuées des relations extraites de manière non supervisée. Le point unique de notre méthode est qu'elle ne nécessite aucun jeu de données étiqueté avec annotation pour les relations personnelles surprenantes. Les résultats de l'évaluation humaine montrent que la méthode proposée pourrait extraire des relations plus intéressantes entre les personnes à partir d'articles Wikipédia japonais qu'une méthode de base basée sur la popularité. Nous montrons notre méthode proposée en tant que plugin Chrome sur la recherche Google.", 'zh': '崇用户在搜索引擎之参与度,求趣于用户之实也。 虽人之所以为文者重,鲜有效以取人。 故立一法,关自然语言惊人性,取人于自然语言文。 吾法先取私于文本树中,而后以无监之数计取分布式示不虞之分。 吾法之独在,不须有注数集来令人讶之。 人之评估之终表明,比于受欢迎之基线法,则取诸日语维基百科文之有趣者。 示以谷歌搜以为chrome插件。', 'ja': '検索エンジンにおけるユーザーエンゲージメントを向上させる1つの方法は、ユーザーに興味深い事実を提案することです。 テキストマイニングの対象として人間関係は重要であるが、人間関係の興味深い関係を抽出するための効果的なアプローチはほとんどない。 そこで、自然言語のテキストから人と人との間の興味深い関係を抽出する方法を、その驚きに着目して提案する。 私たちのメソッドは、まずテキストの依存関係ツリーからすべての個人関係を抽出し、次に抽出された関係の分散表現のサプライズスコアを監督されていない方法で計算します。 私たちのメソッドのユニークな点は、驚くべき個人的な関係のためのアノテーションを含むラベル付けされたデータセットを必要としないことです。 人間の評価の結果は、提案された方法は、人気ベースライン法よりも、日本語ウィキペディアの記事から人々間のより興味深い関係を引き出すことができることを示している。 Googleでは、Google検索で提案された方法をChromeプラグインとして実演しています。', 'hi': 'खोज इंजन में उपयोगकर्ता सगाई को बढ़ाने का एक तरीका उपयोगकर्ता को दिलचस्प तथ्यों का सुझाव देना है। यद्यपि व्यक्तियों के बीच संबंध पाठ खनन के लिए एक लक्ष्य के रूप में महत्वपूर्ण हैं, व्यक्तियों के बीच दिलचस्प संबंधों को निकालने के लिए कुछ प्रभावी दृष्टिकोण हैं। इसलिए हम प्राकृतिक भाषा ग्रंथों से व्यक्तियों के बीच दिलचस्प संबंधों को निकालने के लिए एक विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो उनकी आश्चर्यजनकता पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। हमारी विधि पहले ग्रंथों के लिए निर्भरता पेड़ों से सभी व्यक्तिगत संबंधों को निकालती है और फिर एक असुरक्षित तरीके से निकाले गए रिश्तों के वितरित प्रतिनिधित्व के लिए आश्चर्य स्कोर की गणना करती है। हमारी विधि का अद्वितीय बिंदु यह है कि इसे आश्चर्यजनक व्यक्तिगत संबंधों के लिए एनोटेशन के साथ किसी भी लेबल डेटासेट की आवश्यकता नहीं है। मानव मूल्यांकन के परिणाम बताते हैं कि प्रस्तावित विधि लोकप्रियता-आधारित बेसलाइन विधि की तुलना में जापानी विकिपीडिया लेखों के व्यक्तियों के बीच अधिक दिलचस्प संबंधों को निकाल सकती है। हम Google खोज पर क्रोम प्लगइन के रूप में अपनी प्रस्तावित विधि प्रदर्शित करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Один из способов повысить вовлеченность пользователей в поисковые системы - предложить пользователю интересные факты. Хотя отношения между людьми имеют важное значение в качестве объекта для изучения текста, существует мало эффективных подходов для извлечения интересных отношений между людьми. Поэтому мы предлагаем метод извлечения интересных отношений между людьми из текстов на естественном языке, фокусируясь на их удивительности. Наш метод сначала извлекает все личные отношения из деревьев зависимостей для текстов, а затем вычисляет неожиданные баллы для распределенных представлений извлеченных отношений неконтролируемым образом. Уникальность нашего метода заключается в том, что он не требует какого-либо маркированного набора данных с аннотацией для неожиданных личных отношений. Результаты человеческой оценки показывают, что предлагаемый метод мог бы извлечь более интересные отношения между людьми из статей японской Википедии, чем базовый метод, основанный на популярности. Мы демонстрируем наш предлагаемый метод как хром плагин на поиске Google.', 'ga': 'Bealach amháin chun rannpháirtíocht úsáideoirí in innill chuardaigh a fheabhsú ná fíricí spéisiúla a mholadh don úsáideoir. Cé go bhfuil caidreamh idir daoine tábhachtach mar sprioc do mhianadóireacht téacs, is beag cur chuige éifeachtach atá ann chun na caidrimh shuimiúla idir daoine a bhaint amach. Molaimid mar sin modh chun gaolmhaireachtaí suimiúla a bhaint as téacsanna teanga nádúrtha idir daoine trí dhíriú ar a n-iontas. Ar dtús, baintear amach ár modh gach caidreamh pearsanta ó chrainn spleáchais do na téacsanna agus ansin ríomhtar scóir iontasacha le haghaidh léirithe dáilte ar na gaolmhaireachtaí asbhainte ar bhealach gan mhaoirseacht. Is é an pointe uathúil dár modh ná nach dteastaíonn aon tacar sonraí lipéadaithe le nótaí le haghaidh na gcaidrimh phearsanta iontasacha. Léiríonn torthaí na meastóireachta daonna go bhféadfadh an modh atá beartaithe caidrimh níos suimiúla idir daoine a bhaint as earraí Vicipéid na Seapáine ná modh bonnlíne bunaithe ar tóir. Léirímid ár modh molta mar bhreiseán chrome ar chuardach google.', 'el': 'Ένας τρόπος για να ενισχυθεί η εμπλοκή των χρηστών στις μηχανές αναζήτησης είναι να προτείνει ενδιαφέροντα γεγονότα στον χρήστη. Αν και οι σχέσεις μεταξύ προσώπων είναι σημαντικές ως στόχος για την εξόρυξη κειμένου, υπάρχουν λίγες αποτελεσματικές προσεγγίσεις για την εξαγωγή των ενδιαφέρουσων σχέσεων μεταξύ προσώπων. Ως εκ τούτου, προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο για την εξαγωγή ενδιαφέρουσων σχέσεων μεταξύ προσώπων από κείμενα φυσικής γλώσσας εστιάζοντας στην έκπληξή τους. Η μέθοδος μας εξαλείφει πρώτα όλες τις προσωπικές σχέσεις από δέντρα εξάρτησης για τα κείμενα και στη συνέχεια υπολογίζει βαθμολογίες έκπληξης για κατανεμημένες αναπαραστάσεις των εξαγόμενων σχέσεων χωρίς επίβλεψη. Το μοναδικό σημείο της μεθόδου μας είναι ότι δεν απαιτεί κανένα μαρκαρισμένο σύνολο δεδομένων με σχόλια για τις εκπληκτικές προσωπικές σχέσεις. Τα αποτελέσματα της ανθρώπινης αξιολόγησης δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος θα μπορούσε να εξαγάγει πιο ενδιαφέρουσες σχέσεις μεταξύ ατόμων από τα ιαπωνικά άρθρα της Βικιπαίδειας από μια μέθοδος βάσης που βασίζεται στη δημοτικότητα. Παρουσιάζουμε την προτεινόμενη μέθοδο μας ως πρόσθετο χρωμίου στην αναζήτηση google.', 'hu': 'Az egyik módja annak, hogy fokozza a felhasználói elkötelezettséget a keresőmotorokban, ha érdekes tényeket javasol a felhasználó számára. Bár a személyek közötti kapcsolatok fontosak a szövegbányászatban, kevés hatékony megközelítés létezik a személyek közötti érdekes kapcsolatok kibontására. Ezért egy olyan módszert javaslunk, amely a természetes nyelvű szövegekből kivonja az emberek közötti érdekes kapcsolatokat a meglepetésükre összpontosítva. Módszerünk először az összes személyes kapcsolatot kivonja a szövegekhez a függőségi fákból, majd felügyelet nélkül kiszámítja a kivont kapcsolatok elosztott reprezentációjához szükséges meglepetési pontszámokat. Módszerünk egyedülálló lényege, hogy a meglepő személyes kapcsolatokhoz nincs szükség feliratozott adatkészletre. Az emberi értékelés eredményei azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt módszer érdekesebb kapcsolatokat vonhat ki a japán Wikipédia cikkekből, mint egy népszerűségi alapú alapmódszer. Bemutatjuk javasolt módszerünket króm bővítményként a google keresésen.', 'ka': 'ერთი გზა გამოყენებელი ძიება მოწყობილობის მოწყობილობისთვის უფრო მეტირებად იყო, რომ გამოყენებელისთვის ინტერესური ფაქტები იგივეა. თუმცა ადამიანების შესახებ მნიშვნელოვანია, როგორც ტექსტის მინდომის მიზეზი, არსებობს რამდენიმე ეფექტიური პროგრამები ადამიანების შესახებ ინტერესტიურ ამიტომ ჩვენ მინდომებით საინტერესო პირობლის ტექსტიდან ინტერესო პირობლის შესახებების გამოყენებას, რომლებიც მათი განსხვავებულობისთვის ცნობიერებ ჩვენი მეთოდი პირველად ყველა პირადი პირადი პირადი პირადი პირადი პირადი პირადი პირადი პირადი პირადი პირადი პირადი პირადი პირადი პირადი პირველი პირველი პირველი პირადი პირადი ჩვენი მეთოდის უნიკალური წერტილი არის, რომ ის არ მოჭირდება არაფერი სანიშნო მონაცემების კონტაქტი, რომელიც განსხვავებული პირადგილური პირადგილური გოგ ადამიანის განსაზღვრების წარმოდგენები აჩვენებენ, რომ საზოგადომის მეტი შეიძლება უფრო ინტერესური პირობების გაკეთება წონონიური ვიკიპედიაში ადამიანების შორის პირობების ჩვენ ჩვენი პროგრამეტრის მიზეზი Google ძიებაზე როგორც ქრომის მოდულიName', 'it': "Un modo per migliorare il coinvolgimento degli utenti nei motori di ricerca è quello di suggerire fatti interessanti all'utente. Sebbene le relazioni tra le persone siano importanti come obiettivo per il mining di testo, ci sono pochi approcci efficaci per estrarre le relazioni interessanti tra le persone. Proponiamo quindi un metodo per estrarre interessanti relazioni tra le persone dai testi del linguaggio naturale concentrandoci sulla loro sorpresa. Il nostro metodo estrae prima tutte le relazioni personali dagli alberi di dipendenza per i testi e poi calcola i punteggi a sorpresa per le rappresentazioni distribuite delle relazioni estratte in modo non supervisionato. Il punto unico del nostro metodo è che non richiede alcun set di dati etichettati con annotazione per le sorprendenti relazioni personali. I risultati della valutazione umana mostrano che il metodo proposto potrebbe estrarre relazioni più interessanti tra persone dagli articoli di Wikipedia giapponesi rispetto a un metodo di base basato sulla popolarità. Dimostriamo il nostro metodo proposto come plugin chrome su google search.", 'kk': 'Іздеу тетіктеріне пайдаланушылардың қатынасын көтеру үшін бір жол - пайдаланушыға қызықтық факттерді таңдау. Қатысушылар арасындағы қатынастар мәтін бағалау үшін мақсатты болса да, адамдар арасындағы қызықтық қатынастарды тарқату үшін бірнеше әсер етпейді. Сондықтан біз табиғи тіл мәтіндерінен адамдар арасындағы қызықты қатынастарды тарқату әдісін ұсынамыз. Біздің әдіміміз біріншіден мәтіндердің тәуелсіздік ағаштарынан барлық жеке қатынастарды тарқатып, кейін тарқатылған қатынастардың тәуелсіздігін есептеп береді. Біздің әдіміміздің бірнеше нәтижесі - оның әдімгі қатынастар үшін кейбір жарлық деректер қорлары керек емес. Адам оқиғасының нәтижелері таңдалған тәсілі жапон Википедиядан адамдардың арасындағы қызықтық қатынасын түсіргенін көрсетеді. Google іздеу үшін хром плагин модулі ретінде қолданылатын әдімімізді көрсету.', 'lt': 'Vienas iš būdų pagerinti naudotojų dalyvavimą paieškos varikliuose yra pateikti vartotojui įdomius faktus. Nors asmenų santykiai yra svarbūs kaip tekstų kasybos tikslas, yra nedaug veiksmingų būdų išgauti įdomius asmenų santykius. Todėl pasiūlome metodą, kaip ištraukti įdomius asmenų santykius iš natūralių kalbų tekstų, sutelkdami dėmesį į jų stebuklą. Mūsų metodas pirmiausia ištraukia visus asmeninius santykius iš priklausomybės medžių tekstams ir tada apskaičiuoja stebuklingus rezultatus, skirtus paskirstytiems ištrauktų santykių atstovavimams nepastebimu būdu. Vienintelis mūsų metodo aspektas yra tas, kad jame nereikalaujama jokio pažymėto duomenų rinkinio su įspūdingų asmeninių santykių anotacija. Žmogaus vertinimo rezultatai rodo, kad siūlomas metodas galėtų išgauti įdomiausius asmenų ryšius iš Japonijos Vikipedijos straipsnių nei populiarumu pagrįstą pradinį metodą. Mes parodome savo siūlomą metodą kaip chromo įskiepis google paieškoje.', 'mk': 'Еден начин да се зголеми вклучувањето на корисникот во пребарувачките мотори е да се предложат интересни факти за корисникот. Иако односите помеѓу лицата се важни како цел за рудање текст, постојат неколку ефикасни пристапи за извлекување на интересните односи помеѓу лицата. Затоа предложуваме метод за извлекување интересни односи помеѓу лицата од текстите на природниот јазик со фокусирање на нивното изненадување. Нашиот метод прво ги извадува сите лични односи од дрвјата на зависност за текстовите и потоа ги пресметува изненадувачките резултати за дистрибуираните претставувања на извадените односи на ненадгледуван начин. Единствената точка на нашиот метод е дека не бара никаков означен податок со анотација за изненадувачките лични односи. Резултатите од човечката проценка покажуваат дека предложениот метод може да извлече поинтересни односи помеѓу лицата од јапонските статии на Википедија отколку основен метод на популарност. Го демонстрираме нашиот предложен метод како хромски приклучок за пребарување во google.', 'ml': 'തെരച്ചില്\u200d എഞ്ചിനില്\u200d ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ആക്രമണം വളര്\u200dത്താനുള്ള ഒരു വഴി Although relationships between persons are important as a target for text mining, there are few effective approaches for extracting the interesting relationships between persons.  അതുകൊണ്ട് സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ആളുകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d നിന്നും രസകരമായ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു രീതി നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d ആദ്യം വ്യക്തിപരമായ ബന്ധങ്ങളെല്ലാം ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നത് വൃക്ഷങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വ്യക്തിപരമായ പര നമ്മുടെ രീതിയിലെ പ്രത്യേക പോയിന്\u200dറ് അത്ഭുതപ്പെട്ട വ്യക്തിപരമായ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വിചാരിക്കേണ്ടതില്ല എന്നാണ്. മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിലാസങ്ങളുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതി ഗൂഗിള്\u200d തെരയുന്നതില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ക്രോമിന്\u200d പ്ലഗിന്\u200d ആയി കാ', 'mt': 'Mod wieħed biex jittejjeb l-involviment tal-utenti fil-magni tat-tiftix huwa li jiġu ssuġġeriti fatti interessanti lill-utent. Għalkemm ir-relazzjonijiet bejn il-persuni huma importanti bħala mira għat-tħaffir tat-testi fil-minjieri, hemm ftit approċċi effettivi għall-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet interessanti bejn il-persuni. Għalhekk qed nipproponu metodu għall-estrazzjoni ta’ relazzjonijiet interessanti bejn persuni minn testi lingwistiċi naturali billi niffokaw fuq is-sorpriża tagħhom. Il-metodu tagħna l-ewwel jastrezzjona r-relazzjonijiet personali kollha mis-siġar tad-dipendenza għat-testi u mbagħad jikkalkula l-punteġġi ta’ sorpriża għar-rappreżentazzjonijiet distribwiti tar-relazzjonijiet estratti b’mod mhux sorveljat. Il-punt uniku tal-metodu tagħna huwa li ma jeħtieġx sett ta’ dejta ttikkettat b’annotazzjoni għar-relazzjonijiet personali sorprendenti. The results of the human evaluation show that the proposed method could extract more interesting relationships between persons from Japanese Wikipedia articles than a popularity-based baseline method.  We demonstrate our proposed method as a chrome plugin on google search.', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчийн хайлтын моторын оролцоог нэмэгдүүлэх нэг арга бол хэрэглэгчид сонирхолтой үнэнийг сануулах юм. Хүмүүсийн хоорондын харилцаа нь текст хөрөнгө оруулах зорилго гэж чухал боловч хүмүүсийн хоорондын сонирхолтой харилцаа гаргах зарим арга барилга байдаг. Тиймээс бид хүмүүсийн гайхамшигтай байдлын хэлний текстүүдийн хоорондын сонирхолтой харилцааны тухай сонирхолтой харилцаа гаргах арга зааж байна. Эхлээд бидний арга нь бүх хувийн харилцааны харилцааныг текстүүдийн хамааралтай модоос гаргаж, дараа нь гаргасан харилцааны хуваарилагдсан үзүүлэлтийн үндсэн тоонуудыг тооцоолж байна. Бидний арга хэмжээний сонирхолтой зүйл бол энэ нь хувийн харилцааны гайхалтай харилцааны нэр дэвшүүлэх өгөгдлийн санг хэрэггүй. Хүн төрөлхтний оюутнуудын үр дүнд энэ арга нь Японы Википедийн баримтуудын хоорондын илүү сонирхолтой харилцаа гаргаж чадна. Бид Google хайлтын хром плагин гэдгийг санал өгсөн аргыг үзүүлнэ.', 'pl': 'Jednym ze sposobów na zwiększenie zaangażowania użytkowników w wyszukiwarki jest zasugerowanie użytkownikowi ciekawych faktów. Chociaż relacje między osobami są ważne jako cel eksploracji tekstu, istnieje niewiele skutecznych podejść do wydobycia ciekawych relacji między osobami. Proponujemy zatem metodę wydobycia ciekawych relacji pomiędzy osobami z tekstów językowych naturalnych, skupiając się na ich zaskakującym charakterze. Nasza metoda najpierw wyodrębnia wszystkie relacje osobiste z drzew zależności dla tekstów, a następnie oblicza punkty zaskoczenia dla rozproszonych reprezentacji wyodrębnionych relacji w sposób bez nadzoru. Unikalnym punktem naszej metody jest to, że nie wymaga ona żadnego etykietowanego zbioru danych z adnotacją dla zaskakujących relacji osobistych. Wyniki oceny ludzkiej pokazują, że proponowana metoda mogłaby wydobyć bardziej interesujące relacje między osobami z japońskich artykułów Wikipedii niż metoda bazowa oparta na popularności. Przedstawiamy naszą proponowaną metodę jako wtyczkę chrome w wyszukiwarce Google.', 'no': 'Eit måte å forbetra brukaren i søkjemotorar er å foreslå interessante faktar til brukaren. Selv om forbindelsane mellom personer er viktige som mål for tekstminering, er det få effektive tilnærmingar for å ekstrahera interessante forbindelsane mellom personer. Vi foreslår derfor ein metode for utpakking av interessante forhold mellom personar frå naturspråkstekstar ved å fokusera på sine overraskende. Metoden vårt først ekstraherer alle personlege forhold frå avhengighetstråda for tekstane og deretter reknar ut overraska for distribuerte representasjonar av ekstraherte forhold på ein ukjend måte. Den unike punktet på metoden vår er at det ikkje krev noen merkelige datasett med merkelapp for overraskende personlege forhold. Resultatet av menneskeevalueringa viser at den foreslåde metoden kunne ekstrahera meir interessante forhold mellom personar frå Japanske Wikipedia-artiklar enn ein popularitetsbasert baseline-metode. Vi viser vår foreslått metode som eit krom- programtillegg for Google- søk.', 'ro': 'O modalitate de a spori implicarea utilizatorilor în motoarele de căutare este de a sugera fapte interesante utilizatorului. Deși relațiile dintre persoane sunt importante ca țintă pentru textul mining, există puține abordări eficiente pentru extragerea relațiilor interesante dintre persoane. Prin urmare, propunem o metodă de extragere a relațiilor interesante dintre persoane din textele limbajului natural, concentrându-se pe surprinderea lor. Metoda noastră extrage mai întâi toate relațiile personale din arborii de dependență pentru texte și apoi calculează scorurile surpriză pentru reprezentările distribuite ale relațiilor extrase într-un mod nesupravegheat. Punctul unic al metodei noastre este că nu necesită nici un set de date etichetat cu adnotare pentru relațiile personale surprinzătoare. Rezultatele evaluării umane arată că metoda propusă ar putea extrage relații mai interesante între persoane din articolele Wikipedia japoneze decât o metodă de bază bazată pe popularitate. Vă demonstrăm metoda propusă ca un plugin cromat pe google search.', 'sr': 'Jedan način za unapređenje uključenja korisnika u pretraživačke motore je predložiti zanimljive činjenice korisniku. Iako su veze između osoba važne kao meta za rudarstvo teksta, postoje nekoliko efikasnih pristupa izvlačenju interesantnih odnosa između osoba. Stoga predlažemo metodu izvlačenja interesantnih odnosa između osoba iz teksta prirodnog jezika fokusiranjem na njihovo iznenađenje. Naša metoda prvo izvlači sve lične veze iz drveća zavisnosti za tekstove i onda računa iznenađenja rezultate za raspodjeljene predstave izvlačenih odnosa na neodređen način. Jednostavna tačka našeg metoda je da to ne zahteva nikakve označene podatke sa annotacijom za iznenađujuće lične veze. Rezultati ljudske procjene pokazuju da bi predložena metoda mogla izvući zanimljivije odnose između osoba iz japanskih Wikipedijskih članaka od početne metode popularnosti. Pokazujemo našu predloženu metodu kao krom plugin u Google pretraživanju.', 'si': 'පරීක්ෂණ එන්ජින් වලට ප්\u200dරයෝජකයා සම්බන්ධතාවක් විශ්වාස කරන්න එක විදිය තමයි ප්\u200dරයෝජකයාට සු මිනිස්සු අතර සම්බන්ධ වැදගත් වෙනුවෙන් වැදගත් වෙනුවෙන් ලක්ෂණයක් විදියට, මිනිස්සු අතර සම්බන්ධ සම්බන ඉතින් අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස්වභාවික භාෂාව පාළුවන් අතර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අරගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක අපේ විධානය පළමුවෙන් පුද්ගලික සම්බන්ධතාවක් පිළිගත විදිහට පිළිගත්ත සම්බන්ධතාවක් පිළිගත කරනවා, පස්සේ පිළිගත්ත අපේ විධානයේ විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිකාරය තමයි ඒකෙන් පුද්ගලික පුද්ගලික සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ලේබල් කරපු දත්ත සැ මිනිස්සු විශ්ලේෂණයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදියට ජාපාන් විකිපිඩියා වලින් මිනිස්සු වලින් විශ අපි ගූගුල් හොයාගන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විධානය ක්\u200dරෝම් ප්ලගින් විදියට පෙන්වන්නේ.', 'sv': 'Ett sätt att öka användarnas engagemang i sökmotorer är att föreslå intressanta fakta för användaren. Även om relationer mellan personer är viktiga som mål för textmining finns det få effektiva metoder för att utvinna intressanta relationer mellan personer. Vi föreslår därför en metod för att extrahera intressanta relationer mellan personer från naturliga språktexter genom att fokusera på deras överraskning. Vår metod extraherar först alla personliga relationer från beroendeträd för texterna och beräknar sedan överraskningspoäng för distribuerade representationer av de extraherade relationerna på ett obevakat sätt. Den unika poängen med vår metod är att den inte kräver några märkta datamängder med anteckningar för de överraskande personliga relationerna. Resultaten av den mänskliga utvärderingen visar att den föreslagna metoden skulle kunna extrahera mer intressanta relationer mellan personer från japanska Wikipedia artiklar än en popularitetsbaserad baslinje metod. Vi demonstrerar vår föreslagna metod som en krom plugin på google search.', 'ta': 'தேடு இயந்திரங்களில் பயனர் இணைப்பை மேம்படுத்த ஒரு வழி பயனருக்கு சுவாரஸ்யமான உண்மைகளை பரிந்துரைக்கிறது. ஆனால் உரை கடைசிக்கு ஒரு இலக்காக மக்களுக்கிடையே உள்ள உறவு ஆகையால் இயற்கையான மொழி உரைகளில் இருந்து மக்களுக்கிடையே சுவாரசியமான தொடர்புகளை வெளியேற்றும் முறையை நாம் பரி நம்முடைய முறைமையில் முதலில் சார்ந்த மரங்களில் இருந்து அனைத்து தனிப்பட்ட உறவுகளையும் வெளியேற்றும் பின்னர் உரைகளில் இருந்து மற்றும் வ எங்கள் முறையின் தனிப்பட்ட புள்ளியாகும் என்னவென்றால் அது ஆச்சரியமான தனிப்பட்ட தொடர்புகளுக்கு எந்த குறிப்பிட்ட தக மனித மதிப்பின் முடிவு நாங்கள் எங்கள் முன்னிருப்பிய முறைமையை கூகில் தேடும் ஒரு கிரோம் சொருகியை காட்டுகிறோம்.', 'ms': 'Satu cara untuk meningkatkan keterlibatan pengguna dalam enjin gelintar adalah untuk menyarankan fakta menarik kepada pengguna. Walaupun hubungan antara orang penting sebagai sasaran untuk penambangan teks, terdapat beberapa pendekatan yang efektif untuk mengekstrak hubungan menarik antara orang. Oleh itu, kami cadangkan cara untuk mengekstrak hubungan menarik antara orang dari teks bahasa semulajadi dengan fokus pada kejutan mereka. Kaedah kita pertama-tama mengekstrak semua hubungan peribadi dari pokok dependensi untuk teks dan kemudian menghitung skor kejutan untuk perwakilan yang disebarkan hubungan yang dikekstrak dengan cara yang tidak diawasi. Titik unik kaedah kita adalah ia tidak memerlukan sebarang set data yang ditabel dengan anotasi untuk hubungan peribadi yang mengejutkan. Hasil penilaian manusia menunjukkan bahawa kaedah yang diusulkan boleh mengekstrak hubungan yang lebih menarik antara orang dari artikel Wikipedia Jepun daripada kaedah asas berasaskan popularitas. Kami menunjukkan kaedah kami sebagai pemalam chrome pada pencarian google.', 'ur': 'یوں طریقہ جگہ انجینوں میں استعمال کرنے کا استعمال کرنا ہے کہ کارساز کے لئے جالب حقیقت پیش کرنا ہے. اگرچہ انسانوں کے درمیان رابطہ ایک مقررہ مقررہ طریقہ کے طور پر اہم ہیں، انسانوں کے درمیان رابطہ اٹھانے کے لئے بہت کم اثر کے طریقے ہیں. تو ہم ایک طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں کہ شخصوں کے درمیان طبیعی زبان کے پیغام سے علاقہ والی رابطہ نکالیں ان کی تعجب پر تمرکز کریں۔ ہمارا طریقہ پہلی بار تمام شخصی رابطہ ٹیکسٹ کے درختوں سے نکالتا ہے اور پھر ایک طریقہ سے نکالے ہوئے رابطہ کے تقسیم ہونے کے لئے تعجب اسکور کا شمار کرتا ہے۔ ہمارے طریقے کی مختلف نقطہ یہ ہے کہ اس کے لئے کوئی لابلیٹ ڈیٹ سٹ کی ضرورت نہیں ہے جو عجیب شخصی رابطہ کے لئے اظہار کرتی ہے۔ انسان کی ارزیابی کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ پیشنهاد کا طریقہ جاپانی ویکیپیڈیا کے متعلق لوگوں کے درمیان زیادہ دلچسپ رابطہ نکالے گا۔ ہم نے اپنے پیشنهاد کی طریقہ کو گوگل جگہ کے لئے کرم پلگن کے طور پر دکھا دیتے ہیں.', 'so': 'Isticmaalaha waxaa loola jeedaa in uu horumariyo wadanka isticmaalayaasha looga baahdo waxyaabaha xiiseynaya. In kastoo xiriirka qofka u dhexeeya ay muhiim u yihiin sida goal ay u baahan yihiin kirada qoraalka, waxaa jira in yar oo faa’iido ah oo laga soo bixiyo xiriirka xiiseynaya dadka dhexdooda. Sidaa darteed waxaan soo jeedaynaa qaab ay u soo bixiso xiriir xiiso leh oo u dhexeeya qof ka yimaada qoraalka afka dabiiciga ah si aad ugu fiirsato yaabkooda. Midabkayaga marka hore wuxuu ka soo saaraa xiriirka shakhsiga ah geedaha ku xiran ee qoraalka, kadibna wuxuu xisaabiyaa kooxo la yaabo oo loo kala soocay sharciga xiriirka la soo saaray si aan loo ilaalin. Xarunta nooca gaarka ah waa in looma baahna qof macluumaad la xiriiray oo la yaabeeyo xiriirka shakhsiga ah. The results of the human evaluation show that the proposed method could extract more interesting relationships between persons from Japanese Wikipedia articles than a popularity-based baseline method.  Waxaynu muujinnaa qaababkayaga la soo jeeday oo ah qalabka qoyska ee google raadinta.', 'uz': "@ info Agar odamlar orasidagi munosabatlar matn qismlari uchun muhim bo'lgan bo'lsa, odamlar orasidagi qiziqarli munosabatlarni ajratish uchun juda qiziqarli usullar bor. Шундай қилиб, biz odamlar orasidagi qiziqarli munosabatlarni o'rganish usulini hozir qilamiz va ularning g'oyalarini ajoyib qilish mumkin. Bizning usuli textlarni ishlatuvchi daraxtdan hamma shaxsiy munosabatlarni olib tashlaydi va keyin o'zgarishni tashkilotga ajratilgan huquqlarni hisoblash mumkin. Bizning uning usuli shunday narsa, bu shaxsiy aloqalar uchun hech qanday qo'shilgan maʼlumot tarkibi kerak emas. The results of the human evaluation show that the proposed method could extract more interesting relationships between persons from Japanese Wikipedia articles than a popularity-based baseline method.  Biz quyidagi soʻzni google qidirish uchun chrome plagini ko'rsatdik.", 'vi': 'Một cách để tăng cường cam kết của người dùng trong các động cơ tìm kiếm là gợi ý các dữ kiện thú vị cho người dùng. Mặc dù mối quan hệ giữa người là một mục tiêu cho việc khai thác văn bản, nhưng không có cách nào hiệu quả để khai thác những mối quan hệ thú vị giữa người. Chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp khai thác quan hệ thú vị giữa người từ văn bản ngôn ngữ tự nhiên bằng cách tập trung vào sự ngạc nhiên của họ. Cách của chúng tôi đầu tiên chiết xuất mọi mối quan hệ cá nhân từ cây độ phụ thuộc cho các văn bản và sau đó tính toán điểm bất ngờ cho các biểu hiện được phân phát của các mối quan hệ chiết xuất theo một cách không giám sát. Điểm duy nhất của phương pháp này là nó không yêu cầu bộ dữ liệu có ghi chú để ghi chú cho các mối quan hệ cá nhân đáng ngạc nhiên. Kết quả của đánh giá con người cho thấy phương pháp được đề xuất có thể hấp dẫn các mối quan hệ thú vị hơn giữa những người trên Wikipedia hàng Nhật hơn là một phương pháp cơ bản dựa vào phổ biến. Chúng tôi chứng minh phương pháp đề nghị như crom bổ sung trên Google tìm kiếm.', 'nl': 'Een manier om de betrokkenheid van gebruikers in zoekmachines te vergroten is door interessante feiten aan de gebruiker te suggereren. Hoewel relaties tussen personen belangrijk zijn als doelwit voor text mining, zijn er weinig effectieve benaderingen om de interessante relaties tussen personen te extraheren. Daarom stellen we een methode voor om interessante relaties tussen personen uit natuurtaalteksten te extraheren door te focussen op hun verrassendheid. Onze methode haalt eerst alle persoonlijke relaties uit afhankelijkheidsbomen voor de teksten en berekent vervolgens onverwachte scores voor gedistribueerde representaties van de geëxtraheerde relaties op een onbeheerde manier. Het unieke van onze methode is dat er geen gelabelde dataset met annotatie nodig is voor de verrassende persoonlijke relaties. De resultaten van de menselijke evaluatie tonen aan dat de voorgestelde methode interessantere relaties tussen personen uit Japanse Wikipedia-artikelen zou kunnen extraheren dan een populariteit-baseline-methode. We demonstreren onze voorgestelde methode als een chrome plugin op google search.', 'da': 'En måde at øge brugernes engagement i søgemaskiner på er at foreslå interessante fakta til brugeren. Selvom relationer mellem personer er vigtige som mål for tekstmining, er der få effektive tilgange til at udvinde de interessante relationer mellem personer. Vi foreslår derfor en metode til at udtrække interessante relationer mellem personer fra natursprogtekster ved at fokusere på deres overraskelse. Vores metode udtrækker først alle personlige relationer fra afhængighedstræer til teksterne og beregner derefter overraskelsesscorer for distribuerede repræsentationer af de ekstraherede relationer på en ubevåget måde. Det unikke punkt i vores metode er, at det ikke kræver noget mærket datasæt med annotation til de overraskende personlige relationer. Resultaterne af den menneskelige evaluering viser, at den foreslåede metode kunne udtrække mere interessante relationer mellem personer fra japanske Wikipedia artikler end en popularitetsbaseret baseline metode. Vi demonstrerer vores foreslåede metode som et krom plugin på google søgning.', 'id': 'Satu cara untuk meningkatkan keterlibatan pengguna dalam mesin pencarian adalah menyarankan fakta menarik bagi pengguna. Meskipun hubungan antara orang penting sebagai sasaran untuk penambangan teks, ada beberapa pendekatan efektif untuk mengekstraksi hubungan menarik antara orang. Oleh karena itu kami mengusulkan metode untuk mengekstraksi hubungan menarik antara orang dari teks bahasa alam dengan fokus pada kejutan mereka. Metode kami pertama-tama mengekstrak semua hubungan pribadi dari pohon dependensi untuk teks dan kemudian menghitung skor kejutan untuk representation distribusi hubungan ekstrakt dengan cara yang tidak diawasi. Intinya unik dari metode kita adalah bahwa tidak membutuhkan set data yang ditabel dengan anotasi untuk hubungan pribadi yang mengejutkan. Hasil dari evaluasi manusia menunjukkan bahwa metode yang diusulkan bisa mengekstrak hubungan yang lebih menarik antara orang dari artikel Wikipedia Jepang daripada metode dasar popularitas. Kami menunjukkan metode kami yang diusulkan sebagai plugin chrome dalam pencarian google.', 'de': 'Eine Möglichkeit, das Nutzerengagement in Suchmaschinen zu verbessern, besteht darin, dem Nutzer interessante Fakten vorzuschlagen. Obwohl Beziehungen zwischen Personen als Ziel für Text Mining wichtig sind, gibt es nur wenige effektive Ansätze, um die interessanten Beziehungen zwischen Personen zu extrahieren. Wir schlagen daher eine Methode vor, interessante Beziehungen zwischen Personen aus natursprachlichen Texten zu extrahieren, indem wir uns auf ihre Überraschung konzentrieren. Unsere Methode extrahiert zunächst alle persönlichen Beziehungen aus Abhängigkeitsbäumen für die Texte und berechnet dann unbeaufsichtigt Überraschungswerte für verteilte Darstellungen der extrahierten Beziehungen. Das Besondere an unserer Methode ist, dass für die überraschenden persönlichen Beziehungen kein beschrifteter Datensatz mit Anmerkungen benötigt wird. Die Ergebnisse der menschlichen Auswertung zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagene Methode interessantere Beziehungen zwischen Personen aus japanischen Wikipedia-Artikeln extrahieren könnte als eine popularitätsbasierte Basismethode. Wir demonstrieren unsere vorgeschlagene Methode als Chrome Plugin auf Google Suche.', 'bg': 'Един от начините да подобрите ангажираността на потребителите в търсачките е да предложите интересни факти на потребителя. Въпреки че отношенията между хората са важни като цел за текстовото добиване, има малко ефективни подходи за извличане на интересните взаимоотношения между хората. Затова предлагаме метод за извличане на интересни взаимоотношения между хората от текстовете на естествения език, като се фокусираме върху тяхната изненада. Нашият метод първо извлича всички лични взаимоотношения от дърветата на зависимостта за текстовете и след това изчислява изненадващите оценки за разпределени представи на извлечените взаимоотношения без надзор. Уникалната точка на нашия метод е, че той не изисква никакъв етикетиран набор от данни с анотация за изненадващите лични взаимоотношения. Резултатите от човешката оценка показват, че предложеният метод може да извлече по-интересни взаимоотношения между лица от японски статии в Уикипедия, отколкото базиран на популярност базов метод. Ние демонстрираме нашия предложен метод като хром плъгин при търсене в Гугъл.', 'hr': 'Jedan način za unapređenje uključenja korisnika u pretraživačke motore je predložiti zanimljive činjenice korisniku. Iako su veze između osoba važne kao meta za rudarstvo teksta, postoje nekoliko učinkovitih pristupa izvlačenju zanimljivih odnosa između osoba. Stoga predlažemo metodu izvlačenja zanimljivih odnosa između osoba iz teksta prirodnog jezika fokusiranjem na njihovo iznenađenje. Naša metoda prvo izvlači sve osobne veze iz drveća zavisnosti za tekste i onda proračuna iznenađenja rezultata za raspodjeljene predstave izvlačenih odnosa na neodređen način. Jednostavna točka našeg metoda je da to ne zahtijeva nikakvu označenu kompletu podataka s oznakem za iznenađujuće osobne veze. Rezultati procjene ljudske procjene pokazuju da je predložena metoda mogla izvući zanimljivije odnose između osoba iz japanskih članaka Wikipedije od početne metode na temelju popularnosti. Pokazujemo našu predloženu metodu kao krom plugin na Google pretraživanju.', 'sw': 'Njia moja ya kuongeza ushirikiano wa mtumiaji katika mashine ya kutafuta ni kupendekeza ukweli wa kuvutia kwa mtumiaji. Ingawa mahusiano kati ya watu ni muhimu kama lengo la uchimbaji madini, kuna hatua chache yenye ufanisi wa kutengeneza mahusiano yanayovutia kati ya watu. Kwa hiyo tunapendekeza njia ya kutengeneza mahusiano ya kuvutia kati ya watu kutoka kwenye maandishi ya lugha asili kwa kuangalia kushangaza. Utawala wetu wa kwanza unatoa mahusiano ya watu binafsi kutoka miti inayotegemea kwa ajili ya maandishi na baadae unahesabu vipimo vya kushangaza kwa ajili ya uwakilishi wa mahusiano yaliyotolewa kwa namna isiyo na uhakika. Hali ya kipekee ya mbinu yetu ni kwamba haihitaji taarifa yoyote inayowekwa kwa alama kwa ajili ya mahusiano ya watu binafsi ya kushangaza. Matokeo ya uchunguzi wa binadamu yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu hiyo ilipendekezwa kunaweza kutengeneza mahusiano yanayovutia zaidi kati ya watu kutoka makala za Kijapani ya Wikipedia kuliko njia ya msingi yenye maarufu. Tunaonyesha njia yetu ya kutafuta google.', 'tr': 'Ullançylary gözlemek enjamlarynda gatnaşmak üçin bir ýoly ullançy üçin gyzykly faktlary maslahat etmekdir. Adamlar arasyndaky ilişkiler metin köçürmek üçin maksady bolup möhüm bolsa belki, adamlaryň arasynda gyzykly ilişkileri a çmak üçin azajyk nusgasy bar. Şol sebäpli, tebigy dil metinlerinden adamlaryň arasynda gyzykly baglaşyklary çekmek üçin bir täze teklip berýäris. Bizim yöntemimiz ilk defa textler için bağlılık agaçlarından tüm kişisel ilişkileri çıkarır ve sonra dağıtılmayan şekilde boşaltılan ilişkilerin şaşırtma noktalarını hesaplar. Biziň täzimimiziň esasy nokady şudyr ki, şahsy baglaýyşlaryň sözbaşy bilen nähili etiket edilen dataset gerek däldir. Adamyň deňleşdirmegiň netijesi şol teklip eden yöntemiň Japonça Wikipediýanyň adamlaryň arasynda tanyş tabanly çykyp biljekdigini görkezýär. Biz öz teklif edilen yöntemimizi google gözlemäge chrom baglançy olarak gösteririk.', 'ko': '검색엔진에서 사용자의 참여도를 높이는 방법 중 하나는 사용자에게 재미있는 사실을 추천하는 것이다.사람과 사람 사이의 관계는 텍스트 발굴의 중요한 목표이지만 사람과 사람 사이의 흥미로운 관계를 추출하는 효과적인 방법은 드물다.따라서 우리는 자연 언어 텍스트에서 사람과 사람 사이의 흥미로운 관계를 추출하는 방법을 제시했다.우리의 방법은 먼저 텍스트의 의존 트리에서 모든 개인 관계를 추출한 다음에 추출된 관계의 분포식 표시의 의외의 점수를 무감독으로 계산합니다.우리의 방법의 독특한 점은 놀라운 인간관계를 처리하기 위해 주석이 달린 표기 데이터 집합이 필요하지 않다는 점이다.인간 평가 결과 인기를 바탕으로 하는 기본 방법에 비해 일본 위키백과 글에서 더 많은 흥미로운 인간관계를 추출할 수 있다는 것이 밝혀졌다.우리는 구글 검색에서 우리가 제시한 크롬 플러그인 방법을 보여 주었다.', 'af': "Een manier om gebruiker verhoog te verhoog in soektog masjiene is om interessante fakte aan die gebruiker te voorstel. Alhoewel die verwantings tussen persoon belangrik is as 'n doel vir teks mining, is daar 'n paar effektief toegang vir uittrek van die interessante verwantings tussen persoon. Ons voorstel dan 'n metode om interessante verwantings tussen persoon uit natuurlike taal teks te uittrek deur hulle verwondering te fokus. Ons metode uitpak eerste alle persoonlike verwantings van afhanklikheidbome vir die teks en bereken dan verrassing poeiers vir verspreidige voorstellings van die uitgevoerde verwantings op 'n ononderwerp manier. Die unieke punt van ons metode is dat dit nie nodig enige etiketeerde datastel met annotasie vir die verwonderende persoonlike verhouding nie. Die resultate van die menslike evaluering vertoon dat die voorgestelde metode meer interessante verhouding tussen persoon van Japaanse Wikipedia-artikels kan uittrek as 'n populariteit-gebaseerde basisline metode. Ons wys ons voorgestelde metode as 'n chrome inprop op Google soektog.", 'fa': 'یک راهی برای افزایش مشترک کاربر در موتور جستجو است که حقیقت جالبی را برای کاربر پیشنهاد دهد. اگرچه رابطه بین افراد به عنوان هدف خرید کردن متن مهم است، چند روش موثری برای خروج رابطه جالبی بین افراد وجود دارد. بنابراین ما یک روش پیشنهاد می کنیم که رابطه های جالبی بین افراد از متن های زبان طبیعی با تمرکز به سورپرایزش آنها برسونیم. روش ما اول همه رابطه\u200cهای شخصی را از درختان بستگی برای متن خارج می\u200cکند و سپس امتیاز سورپرایز را برای نمایش\u200cهای پراکنده\u200cی رابطه\u200cهای خارج شده به طریق غیرقابل تحریک محاسبه می\u200cکند. نقطه متفاوت روش ما این است که هیچ مجموعه\u200cی داده\u200cهای نقاشی برای رابطه\u200cهای شخصی عجیب نیاز ندارد. نتایج ارزیابی انسان نشان می دهد که این روش پیشنهاد می تواند رابطه های جالبتر بین افراد از مقاله های ویکیپدید ژاپنی از روش بنیادی بر اساس شهرت استخراج کند. ما روش پیشنهاد خود را به عنوان یک plugin کروم در جستجوی گوگل نشان می دهیم.', 'sq': 'Një mënyrë për të përmirësuar angazhimin e përdoruesit në motorët e kërkimit është të sugjerojmë fakte interesante për përdoruesin. Megjithëse marrëdhëniet midis personave janë të rëndësishme si një objektiv për minierën e teksteve, ka pak metoda efektive për nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve interesante midis personave. Prandaj propozojmë një metodë për të nxjerrë marrëdhënie interesante midis njerëzve nga tekstet e gjuhës natyrore duke u përqëndruar në surprizën e tyre. Metoda jonë nxjerr së pari të gjitha marrëdhëniet personale nga pemët e varësisë për tekstet dhe pastaj llogarit rezultatet e befasive për përfaqësimet e shpërndara të marrëdhënieve të nxjerra në një mënyrë të pa mbikqyrur. Puna unike e metodës sonë është se ajo nuk kërkon asnjë set të dhënash të etiketuar me anotacion për marrëdhëniet personale të çuditshme. Rezultatet e vlerësimit njerëzor tregojnë se metoda e propozuar mund të nxjerrë marrëdhënie më interesante midis personave nga artikujt japonezë të Wikipedias sesa një metodë bazë popullariteti. Ne demonstrojmë metodën tonë të propozuar si një plugin chrome në kërkim në google.', 'az': 'İstifadəçilərin arama motorlarında iştirak etməsi üçün bir yol istifadəçin in maraqlı faktlarını təbliğ etməkdir. İnsanların arasındakı ilişkiler məktub maddiyinin məqsədi olaraq möhüm olsa da, insanlar arasında maraqlı ilişkiler çıxarmaq üçün az effektiv yollar var. Beləliklə, təbiətli dil mətnlərindən insanlar arasında maraqlı ilişkileri çıxartmaq üçün bir yol təklif edirik ki, onların təəccüblərinə odaqlayıb. Bizim metodumuz ilk dəfə textlər üçün bağımlılıq ağaclarından bütün kişilər ilişkiləri çıxarır və sonra dağıtılmış ilişkilərin müəyyən edilməsi üçün təəccüblü nöqtələri hesablar. Bizim metodumuzun bənzər noktası təəccüblü kişisel ilişkiler üçün məlumatları ilə etiketlənmiş verilən qurğular lazımdır. İnsan değerlendirməsinin sonuçları göstərir ki, bu təklif metodu Japon Wikipedia maddələrindən insanların arasındakı daha maraqlı ilişkileri məşğul edilir. Biz Google araşdırmalarında krom plagini olaraq təklif etdiyimizi göstəririk.', 'bn': 'অনুসন্ধান ইঞ্জিনে ব্যবহারকারীদের অংশগ্রহণ বৃদ্ধি করার একটি উপায় হচ্ছে ব্যবহারকারীর কাছে মজার বাস্তবতা প্রস যদিও লেখা খনির লক্ষ্য হিসেবে মানুষের মধ্যে সম্পর্ক গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, তবে মানুষের মধ্যে মজার সম্পর্ক বের করার জন্য কিছু কার্ তাই আমরা প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা টেক্সট থেকে ব্যক্তিদের মধ্যে কৌতূহলজনক সম্পর্ক বের করার একটি পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি তাদের বিস আমাদের পদ্ধতি প্রথমে লেখার জন্য নির্ভরশীল গাছ থেকে সকল ব্যক্তিগত সম্পর্ক বের করে ফেলেছে এবং তারপর বিস্ময়কর স্কোর হিসেবে হিসেব করেছে যে বিভি আমাদের পদ্ধতির অনন্য বিষয় হচ্ছে যে ব্যক্তিগত সম্পর্কের বিস্ময়কর ক্ষেত্রে এটি কোন লেবেলেড ডাটাসেটের প্রয়োজন নেই। মানুষের মূল্যের ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি জাপানী উইকিপিডিয়া প্রবন্ধের মাধ্যমে জনপ্রিয় ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক মূল্যে We demonstrate our proposed method as a chrome plugin on google search.', 'ca': "One way to enhance user engagement in search engines is to suggest interesting facts to the user.  Encara que les relacions entre persones són importants com a objectiu per a la mineria de textos, hi ha pocs enfocaments efectius per extrair les relacions interessants entre persones. Per tant, proposem un mètode per extrair relacions interessants entre persones dels textos de llenguatge natural centrant-nos en la seva sorpresa. El nostre mètode extrau primer totes les relacions personals dels arbres de dependencia per als textos i després calcula puntuacions sorprenents per representacions distribuïdes de les relacions extraïdes d'una manera no supervisada. El punt únic del nostre mètode és que no necessita cap conjunt de dades etiquetat amb anotació per les relacions personals sorprenents. Els resultats de l'evaluació human a mostren que el mètode proposat podria extrair relacions més interessants entre persones d'articles japonès de Wikipedia que un mètode basat en la popularitat. Demonstrem el nostre mètode proposat com a complement de crome en la recerca en google.", 'bs': 'Jedan način za unapređenje uključenja korisnika u pretraživačke motore je predložiti zanimljive činjenice korisniku. Iako su veze između osoba važne kao meta za rudarstvo teksta, postoje nekoliko efikasnih pristupa izvlačenju interesantnih odnosa između osoba. Stoga predlažemo metodu izvlačenja zanimljivih odnosa između osoba iz teksta prirodnog jezika fokusiranjem na njihovo iznenađenje. Naša metoda prvo izvlači sve osobne veze iz drveća zavisnosti za tekste i onda proračuna iznenađenja rezultate za raspodjeljene predstave izvlačenih odnosa na neodređen način. Jednostavna tačka našeg metoda je da to ne zahtijeva nikakve označene podatke sa annotacijom za iznenađujuće lične veze. Rezultati procjene ljudske procjene pokazuju da bi predložena metoda mogla izvući zanimljivije odnose između osoba iz japanskih članaka Wikipedije od početne metode na osnovu popularnosti. Pokazujemo našu predloženu metodu kao krom plugin u Google pretraživanju.', 'cs': 'Jedním ze způsobů, jak zvýšit zapojení uživatelů do vyhledávačů, je navrhnout uživatelům zajímavá fakta. Ačkoli jsou vztahy mezi osobami důležité jako cíl pro text mining, existuje jen málo efektivních přístupů k extrakci zajímavých vztahů mezi osobami. Proto navrhujeme metodu extrakce zajímavých vztahů mezi osobami z přirozených jazykových textů se zaměřením na jejich překvapení. Naše metoda nejprve extrahuje všechny osobní vztahy ze stromů závislostí pro texty a následně bez dohledu vypočítá skóre překvapení pro distribuované reprezentace extrahovaných vztahů. Jedinečným bodem naší metody je, že pro překvapivé osobní vztahy nevyžaduje žádnou označenou sadu dat s anotací. Výsledky lidského hodnocení ukazují, že navržená metoda by mohla extrahovat zajímavější vztahy mezi osobami z japonských článků Wikipedie než základní metoda založená na popularitě. Ukážeme naši navrhovanou metodu jako chrome plugin na Google Search.', 'et': 'Üks võimalus suurendada kasutajate kaasatust otsingumootorites on pakkuda kasutajale huvitavaid fakte. Kuigi inimestevahelised suhted on tekstikaevandamise sihtmärgina olulised, on vähe efektiivseid lähenemisviise inimestevaheliste huvitavate suhete väljatõmbamiseks. Seetõttu pakume välja meetodi inimeste vaheliste huvitavate suhete eraldamiseks looduskeelsetest tekstidest, keskendudes nende üllatavusele. Meie meetod ekstraheerib kõigepealt tekstide sõltuvuspuudest kõik isiklikud suhted ja arvutab seejärel ekstraheeritud seoste jaotatud esituste üllatuskoorid järelevalveta viisil. Meie meetodi ainulaadne punkt on see, et see ei vaja üllatavate isiklike suhete jaoks märgistatud andmekogumit märgistusega. Inimeste hindamise tulemused näitavad, et kavandatud meetod võiks Jaapani Vikipeedia artiklitest välja tuua huvitavamaid suhteid inimeste vahel kui populaarsuspõhine lähtemeetod. Me demonstreerime meie pakutud meetodit nagu chrome plugin google otsing.', 'am': 'የተጠቃሚውን ግንኙነት ለመጨመር የኢንተርኔት ማድረግ አንድ መንገድ ነው፡፡ Although relationships between persons are important as a target for text mining, there are few effective approaches for extracting the interesting relationships between persons.  ስለዚህ በአካባቢው ቋንቋ ጽሑፎች መካከል የሚጠያየቁ ግንኙነትን ለማውጣት እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ መጀመሪያ የግንኙነታችንን ሁሉ የግንኙነት ግንኙነት ከመታሰሪያ ዛፎች ይወስዳል፡፡ ከዚያም በኋላ የውጭ ግንኙነቶችን በተለየ መልዕክት በተለየ ጥያቄ ይቆጥራል፡፡ የሥርዓታችን ግንኙነት የግንኙነት ግንኙነት የሚያስደነቅ የግንኙነት ግንኙነት የሚያስደነግፍ ዳታ ማሰሪያ አያስፈልግም፡፡ የሰው ውጤት ውጤቶች በተዘጋጀው ሥርዓት ከጃፓን Wikipedia ጽሑፎች መካከል ከሚያሳየው የበለጠ የአማረ ግንኙነት ማውጣት ይችላል፡፡ የክሮም ፕሮግራም የጎግል ፈለጊ ሲሆን እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Օգտագործողների ներգրավումը որոնման մեքենաներում բարելավելու միջոցով հետաքրքիր փաստեր առաջարկելն է օգտագործողին: Չնայած, որ մարդկանց միջև հարաբերությունները կարևոր են որպես տեքստի հանման նպատակ, կան մի քանի արդյունավետ մոտեցումներ մարդկանց միջև հետաքրքիր հարաբերությունների հանելու համար: Հետևաբար մենք առաջարկում ենք մի մեթոդ մարդկանց միջև հետաքրքիր հարաբերությունների դուրս բերելու բնական լեզվի տեքստներից, կենտրոնացնելով նրանց զարմանալու վրա: Մեր մեթոդը նախ հանում է բոլոր անձնական հարաբերությունները կախվածության ծառերից հաղորդագրությունների համար և հետո հաշվարկում է զարմանալի արդյունքները բաշխված հարաբերությունների ներկայացումների համար անվերահսկված կերպով: Մեր մեթոդի յուրահատուկ կետը նրանում է, որ այն չի պահանջում որևէ պիտակուցված տվյալների համակարգ, որտեղ նկարագրված են զարմանալի անձնական հարաբերությունները: Մարդկային գնահատման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված մեթոդը կարող է ավելի հետաքրքիր հարաբերություններ ստանալ ճապոնացի Վիքիփեդիայի հոդվածներից մարդկանց միջև, քան բնակչության հիմնական մեթոդը: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս մեր առաջարկված մեթոդը որպես քրոմային պարունակություն Google որոնման համար:', 'fi': 'Yksi tapa parantaa käyttäjien sitoutumista hakukoneisiin on ehdottaa käyttäjälle mielenkiintoisia faktoja. Vaikka ihmisten väliset suhteet ovat tärkeitä tekstilouhinnan kohteena, on olemassa vain vähän tehokkaita lähestymistapoja ihmisten välisten kiinnostavien suhteiden purkamiseen. Siksi ehdotamme menetelmää, jolla luonnollisen kielen teksteistä saadaan kiintoisia suhteita ihmisten välillä keskittymällä niiden yllättävyyteen. Menetelmämme poimii ensin kaikki henkilökohtaiset suhteet riippuvuuspuusta tekstejä varten ja laskee sitten yllätyspisteet purettujen suhteiden hajautetulle esittämiselle valvomattomalla tavalla. Menetelmämme ainutlaatuinen pointti on se, että se ei vaadi mitään merkittyä aineistoa huomautuksilla yllättäviin henkilökohtaisiin suhteisiin. Ihmisarvioinnin tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotettu menetelmä voisi poimia japanilaisista Wikipedian artikkeleista mielenkiintoisempia suhteita henkilöiden välillä kuin suosioon perustuva perusmenetelmä. Esittelemme ehdotetun menetelmän chrome plugin google search.', 'jv': 'Wong wong liya kanggo nggunakake perusahaan kanggo ngelambang engin pangguna kuwi nggawe barang sing apik nggawe usuri. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Awakdhéwé nggunakake sistem kanggo nggawe barang akeh-barang kanggo wong liyane ing sakjane kanggo ngwala urip kuwi nggawe gerakan surang. Awak dhéwé sistem sing perusahaan tanggal gak perusahaan kanggo nggawe barang kelas kuwi nggawe barang kotak Where am I Rejalaké pancening pancening wong tambah kuwi supoyo nggawe sistem sing bisa nguasai perusahaan anyar sampeyan anyar wiyane suku kelas nang cukup wiyane kapan ginarané Awak dhéwé éntukno ngéwangi téhal kanggo kelas chrome plugin nang Google', 'he': 'One way to enhance user engagement in search engines is to suggest interesting facts to the user.  למרות מערכות יחסים בין אנשים חשובות כמטרה למכרת טקסטים, יש מעט גישות יעילות לחלץ מערכות יחסים מעניינות בין אנשים. לכן אנו מציעים שיטה להוציא מערכות יחסים מעניינות בין אנשים מסמכי שפה טבעיים על ידי להתמקד בהפתעה שלהם. Our method first extracts all personal relationships from dependency trees for the texts and then calculates surprise scores for distributed representations of the extracted relationships in an unsupervised manner.  הנקודה הייחודית של השיטה שלנו היא שהיא לא דורשת שום קבוצת מידע מסוממת עם הערות למערכות יחסים אישיות המפתיעות. תוצאות הערכה האנושית מראות שהשיטה המוצעת יכולה להוציא מערכות יחסים מעניינות יותר בין אנשים ממאמרים ויקיפדיה יפנית מאשר שיטה בסיסית פופולריות. אנחנו מציגים את השיטה המוצעת שלנו בתוספת כרומה על חיפוש גוגל.', 'sk': 'Eden od načinov za povečanje udeležbe uporabnikov v iskalnikih je predlaganje zanimivih dejstev uporabniku. Čeprav so odnosi med osebami pomembni kot cilj besedilnega rudarjenja, je malo učinkovitih pristopov za izvlečevanje zanimivih odnosov med osebami. Zato predlagamo metodo za izvlečevanje zanimivih odnosov med osebami iz besedil v naravnem jeziku s poudarkom na njihovi presenetljivosti. Naša metoda najprej izvleče vse osebne odnose iz dreves odvisnosti za besedila in nato izračuna ocene presenečenja za porazdeljene predstavitve izvlečenih odnosov na nenadzorovan način. Edinstvena točka naše metode je, da ne zahteva nobenega označenega nabora podatkov z opombami za presenetljive osebne odnose. Rezultati človeške ocene kažejo, da bi predlagana metoda lahko iz japonskih Wikipedijskih člankov izvlekla zanimivejše odnose med osebami kot osnovna metoda, ki temelji na popularnosti. Prikazujemo našo predlagano metodo kot chrome vtičnik na Googlovem iskanju.', 'ha': "Tsarin ya fi ƙara shirin mai amfani da shi cikin mashine masu kiyaye, yana shawarar da gaskiyar masu amfani da shi. Ingawa da danganta da mutane sun yi muhimu zuwa matsayin, don haka da manyan matsayi masu amfani ga su fitar da danganta mai amfani a tsakanin mutane. Saboda haka, Munã buɗa wani hanyoyi wa ka fitar da danganta masu sha'awa a tsakanin mutane daga littãfin harshen asiyya, sai Mu yi makini zuwa ajalinsu. Kayan hanyoyinMu na sami duk masu husũma na danganta daga itãcen da ke dõgara ga littãfin kuma yana hisãbi score da aka rarrabe wa masu tsakanin da aka samu da danganta da ba'a tsare. Halin ɗabi'a na hanyoyinmu yana cẽwa ba za ta buƙata wani danne da aka rubũta shi ba, yana da zane wa danganta masu ban mãmãki. The results of the human evaluation show that the proposed method could extract more interesting relationships between persons from Japanese Wikipedia articles than a popularity-based baseline method.  Muna nuna hanyoyinmu wanda aka yi niyyar da shi kamar wata lokacin chrono a kan Search Google.", 'bo': 'འཚོལ་བཤེར་གྱི་ནང་དུ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་དམིགས་བསལ་འདོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཅིག་ནི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་དངོས་གནས་ཚུལ་སྟོན་རྒྱུ་ མི་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་ནི་ཡིག་གེ་བཞག དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་རང་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཡིག་གི་མི་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཐད་ཀར་དམིགས་འབྲེལ་བ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་དགོས། ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དང་པོ་དེ་ཡིག་གི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡོངས་ཀྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡོངས་དང་དེ་ལས་ཕར་མེད་པའི་འབྲེལ་བ་ཚོ་དང་མི་གཞན་པའི་བརྗོད་མཁན་ཚུ་རྩིས་ ང་ཚོའི་ལམ་ལུགས་འདིའི་ཁྱད་དུ་འཕགས་རིས་མེད་པའི་མིང མིའི་རྐྱེན་འབྲས་མིན་བཟོ་བརྟན་ན། དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་འདིའི་ནང་གི་མི་སྒེར་གྱི་Wikipedia་ཡི་གེ་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བ་མང་ཙམ་ཐུབ་ ང་ཚོས་google འཚོལ་བཤེར་ཐོག་གི་མཐོང་སྣང་གསར་བ་ཞིག་གི་བྱ་རིམ་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Paladin : an annotation tool based on active and proactive learning', 'ar': 'Paladin: أداة شرح مبنية على التعلم النشط والاستباقي', 'fr': "Paladin\xa0: un outil d'annotation basé sur un apprentissage actif et proactif", 'pt': 'Paladin: uma ferramenta de anotação baseada em aprendizado ativo e proativo', 'es': 'Paladin: una herramienta de anotación basada en el aprendizaje activo y proactivo', 'ja': 'パラディン：アクティブで積極的な学習に基づく注釈ツール', 'ru': 'Paladin: инструмент аннотации, основанный на активном и упреждающем обучении', 'zh': 'Paladin:基于注器', 'hi': 'Paladin: सक्रिय और सक्रिय सीखने के आधार पर एक एनोटेशन उपकरण', 'ga': 'Paladin: uirlis nótaí bunaithe ar fhoghlaim ghníomhach agus réamhghníomhach', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Παλαντίν: ένα εργαλείο σχολιασμού βασισμένο στην ενεργή και προληπτική μάθηση', 'kk': 'Паладин: белсенді және проактивті оқытуға негізделген жазбалар құралыName', 'it': "Paladin: uno strumento di annotazione basato sull'apprendimento attivo e proattivo", 'lt': 'Paladin: aktyvaus ir aktyvaus mokymosi anotacijos priemonė', 'ms': 'Paladin: alat anotasi berdasarkan pembelajaran aktif dan proaktif', 'mk': 'Паладин: алатка за анотација базирана на активно и проактивно учење', 'mt': 'Paladin: għodda ta’ annotazzjoni bbażata fuq tagħlim attiv u proattiv', 'ml': 'പാലാദിന്\u200d: സജ്ജീവമായ പഠനം അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു അഭിപ്രായം ഉപകരണം', 'mn': 'Паладин: идэвхтэй, сэтгэл хөдлөлтэй суралцах', 'pl': 'Paladin: narzędzie do adnotacji oparte na aktywnym i proaktywnym uczeniu się', 'no': 'Paladin: eit notasjonsverktøy basert på aktiv og proaktiv læring', 'ro': 'Paladin: un instrument de adnotare bazat pe învățarea activă și proactivă', 'sr': 'Paladin: alat za annotaciju baziran na aktivnom i aktivnom učenju', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Paladin: qalabka caafimaadka ee ku saleysan waxbarashada fircoon iyo waxqabad ah', 'sv': 'Paladin: ett anteckningsverktyg baserat på aktivt och proaktivt lärande', 'ta': 'பாலாடின்: செயற்படுத்தல் மற்றும் செயலில் படிப்பதற்கு அடிப்படையிலான ஒரு அறிவிப்பு கருவி', 'ur': 'پالادین: فعال اور غیرفعال تعلیم پر بنیاد ایک اظہار تولیل', 'hu': 'Paladin: egy aktív és proaktív tanuláson alapuló jegyzetfelvételi eszköz', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Paladin: một dụng cụ chú thích dựa trên hoạt động và tích cực học', 'bg': 'Паладин: инструмент за анотация, базиран на активно и проактивно обучение', 'da': 'Paladin: et annotationsværktøj baseret på aktiv og proaktiv læring', 'hr': 'Paladin: alat za annotaciju baziran na aktivnom i proaktivnom učenju', 'nl': 'Paladin: een annotatietool gebaseerd op actief en proactief leren', 'id': 'Paladin: alat anotasi berdasarkan belajar aktif dan proaktif', 'fa': 'Name', 'ko': '성기사: 능동적이고 능동적인 학습을 바탕으로 하는 주석 도구', 'de': 'Paladin: ein Annotationstool basierend auf aktivem und proaktivem Lernen', 'sw': 'Paladin: chombo cha kuchangaza kinachotokana na kujifunza kwa haraka', 'sq': 'Paladin: an annotation tool based on active and proactive learning', 'tr': 'Paladin:aktif ve aktif öğrenme tabanlı bir duyurma aracı', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'Paladin', 'hy': 'Պալադին: Ակտիվ և պրոակտիվ ուսումնասիրության հիմքում հիմնված annoտացիոն գործիք', 'bn': 'পালাদিন: সক্রিয় এবং সক্রিয় শিক্ষার উপর ভিত্তিক একটি বিশেষ টুল', 'ca': "Paladin: una eina d'anotació basada en l'aprenentatge actiu i proactiu", 'cs': 'Paladin: anotace nástroj založený na aktivním a proaktivním učení', 'az': 'Paladin: aktif v…ô proaktif √∂yr…ônm…ôy…ô dayanan bir bildirim aracńĪ', 'bs': 'Paladin: alat za annotaciju baziran na aktivnom i aktivnom učenju', 'et': 'Paladin: aktiivsel ja ennetaval õppimisel põhinev annoteerimisvahend', 'fi': 'Paladin: aktiiviseen ja ennakoivaan oppimiseen perustuva huomautustyökalu', 'sk': 'Paladin: orodje za opombe, ki temelji na aktivnem in proaktivnem učenju', 'ha': '@ info: tooltip', 'he': 'פאלדין: כלי הערות מבוסס על לימוד פעיל ופרואקטיבי', 'jv': 'Paldine: Advertu sing basa supoyo mulai lan akèh seneng pisan', 'bo': 'Paladin: an annotation tool based on active and proactive learning'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we present Paladin, an open-source web-based annotation tool for creating high-quality multi-label document-level datasets. By integrating active learning and proactive learning to the annotation task, Paladin makes the task less time-consuming and requiring less human effort. Although Paladin is designed for multi-label settings, the system is flexible and can be adapted to other tasks in single-label settings.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقدم Paladin ، وهي أداة شرح مفتوحة المصدر تعتمد على الويب لإنشاء مجموعات بيانات عالية الجودة ومتعددة التسميات على مستوى المستندات. من خلال دمج التعلم النشط والتعلم الاستباقي في مهمة التعليق التوضيحي ، يجعل Paladin المهمة أقل استهلاكًا للوقت وتتطلب جهدًا بشريًا أقل. على الرغم من أن Paladin مصمم لإعدادات متعددة التسميات ، إلا أن النظام مرن ويمكن تكييفه مع مهام أخرى في إعدادات تسمية واحدة.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos o Paladin, uma ferramenta de anotação baseada na Web de código aberto para a criação de conjuntos de dados em nível de documento com vários rótulos de alta qualidade. Ao integrar o aprendizado ativo e o aprendizado proativo à tarefa de anotação, o Paladin torna a tarefa menos demorada e requer menos esforço humano. Embora o Paladin seja projetado para configurações de vários rótulos, o sistema é flexível e pode ser adaptado a outras tarefas em configurações de rótulo único.', 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos Paladin, una herramienta de anotación basada en web de código abierto para crear conjuntos de datos de alta calidad a nivel de documentos de múltiples etiquetas. Al integrar el aprendizaje activo y el aprendizaje proactivo en la tarea de anotación, Paladin hace que la tarea requiera menos tiempo y menos esfuerzo humano. Aunque Paladin está diseñado para configuraciones de etiquetas múltiples, el sistema es flexible y se puede adaptar a otras tareas en configuraciones de una sola etiqueta.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons Paladin, un outil d'annotation Web open source permettant de créer des ensembles de données de haute qualité au niveau des documents multi-étiquettes. En intégrant l'apprentissage actif et l'apprentissage proactif à la tâche d'annotation, Paladin simplifie la tâche et réduit les efforts humains. Bien que Paladin soit conçu pour les configurations multi-étiquettes, le système est flexible et peut être adapté à d'autres tâches dans des configurations à étiquette unique.", 'ja': '本稿では、高品質のマルチラベルドキュメントレベルデータセットを作成するためのオープンソースのWebベースのアノテーションツールであるPaladinを紹介する。積極的な学習と積極的な学習をアノテーションタスクに統合することで、パラディンはタスクの時間がかかりにくくなり、人間の労力がかからなくなります。パラディンはマルチラベル設定用に設計されていますが、システムは柔軟性があり、シングルラベル設定で他のタスクに適応できます。', 'zh': '本文引Paladin,盖Web开源注具,所以创高质量者多标文档级数集也。 因将自学及注事,Paladin使更省时,须更少力。 虽Paladin为多署设而设之,然当系统非常灵活,可以应单标之他务。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले बहु-लेबल दस्तावेज़-स्तरीय डेटासेट बनाने के लिए एक ओपन-सोर्स वेब-आधारित एनोटेशन टूल, पलाडिन प्रस्तुत करते हैं। एनोटेशन कार्य के लिए सक्रिय सीखने और सक्रिय सीखने को एकीकृत करके, पलाडिन कार्य को कम समय लेने वाला बनाता है और कम मानव प्रयास की आवश्यकता होती है। हालांकि Paladin बहु-लेबल सेटिंग्स के लिए डिज़ाइन किया गया है, सिस्टम लचीला है और एकल-लेबल सेटिंग्स में अन्य कार्यों के लिए अनुकूलित किया जा सकता है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем Paladin, веб-инструмент аннотации с открытым исходным кодом для создания высококачественных многоуровневых наборов данных на уровне документов. Интегрируя активное обучение и упреждающее обучение в задачу аннотации, Паладин делает задачу менее трудоемкой и требующей меньше человеческих усилий. Несмотря на то, что Paladin разработан для многоуровневых настроек, система является гибкой и может быть адаптирована к другим задачам в одноуровневых настройках.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair Paladin, uirlis foinse oscailte anótála gréasán-bhunaithe chun tacair sonraí ardcháilíochta illipéid ar leibhéal doiciméad a chruthú. Trí fhoghlaim ghníomhach agus foghlaim réamhghníomhach a chomhtháthú leis an tasc anótála, déanann Paladin níos lú ama den tasc agus éilíonn sé níos lú iarracht dhaonna. Cé go bhfuil Paladin deartha le haghaidh socruithe illipéid, tá an córas solúbtha agus is féidir é a oiriúnú do thascanna eile i socruithe aon-lipéad.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტში ჩვენ Paladin-ს გამოსახულებთ, საბოლოდ გახსნილი ინოტომაციის ხელსაწყოთა მონაცემების საქაღალდე, რომელიც უფრო კარგად მრავალური დოკუმენტი აქტიური სწავლების და პროკეტიური სწავლების ინტერგურაციით ამოტომაციის რაოდენობაში, Paladin დავაკეთებ რაოდენობას უფრო ცოტა დროს გამოყენება და უფრო ცოტა მაგრამ Paladin multi-label პარამეტრებისთვის განაზღვრებულია, სისტემა ძალიან გრძნობელია და შეიძლება განაზღვრება სხვა პარამეტრებისთვის ერთადერთი სისტემაში.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a Paladint, egy nyílt forráskódú webalapú jegyzetfelvételi eszközt, amely kiváló minőségű, többcímkés dokumentumszintű adatkészletek létrehozására szolgál. Az aktív tanulás és a proaktív tanulás integrálásával a jegyzetelési feladatba, a Paladin kevésbé időigényes és kevesebb emberi erőfeszítést igényel. Bár a Paladint többcímkés beállításokhoz tervezték, a rendszer rugalmas, és egycímkés beállításokkal más feladatokhoz is igazítható.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε το Paladin, ένα εργαλείο σχολιασμού ανοιχτού κώδικα για τη δημιουργία υψηλής ποιότητας συνόλων δεδομένων σε επίπεδο εγγράφων πολλαπλών ετικετών. Με την ενσωμάτωση της ενεργού μάθησης και της προληπτικής μάθησης στην εργασία σχολιασμού, το κάνει την εργασία λιγότερο χρονοβόρα και απαιτεί λιγότερη ανθρώπινη προσπάθεια. Αν και έχει σχεδιαστεί για ρυθμίσεις πολλαπλών ετικετών, το σύστημα είναι ευέλικτο και μπορεί να προσαρμοστεί σε άλλες εργασίες σε ρυθμίσεις ενιαίας ετικέτας.', 'it': "In questo articolo presentiamo Paladin, uno strumento di annotazione open source basato sul web per creare set di dati multi-etichetta di alta qualità a livello di documento. Integrando l'apprendimento attivo e l'apprendimento proattivo al compito di annotazione, Paladin rende l'attività meno dispendiosa in termini di tempo e richiede meno sforzo umano. Anche se Paladin è progettato per impostazioni multi-etichetta, il sistema è flessibile e può essere adattato ad altre attività con impostazioni monoetichetta.", 'mk': 'Во овој весник го претставуваме Паладин, алатка за отворен извор на веб-базирана анотација за создавање висококвалитетни мнокалитетни податоци на документско ниво. Со интеграцијата на активното учење и проактивното учење во задачата за анотација, Паладин ја прави задачата помалку потребна за време и бара помалку човечки напори. Although Paladin is designed for multi-label settings, the system is flexible and can be adapted to other tasks in single-label settings.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, біз Paladin дегенді ашық көзге негізделген веб- көзге сапатты көп жарлық құжат деңгейіндегі деректер қорларын құру құралын көрсетедік. Назардағы оқыту мен проактивті оқыту тапсырмасын біріктіру арқылы Паладин тапсырманы уақытты пайдалану және адамдардың күшесін төмендету керек болады. Паладин көп жарлық параметрлері үшін құрылған болса да, жүйе бір жарлық жарлық параметрлерінде басқа тапсырмалар үшін өзгертуге болады.', 'lt': 'In this paper, we present Paladin, an open-source web-based annotation tool for creating high-quality multi-label document-level datasets.  By integrating active learning and proactive learning to the annotation task, Paladin makes the task less time-consuming and requiring less human effort.  Although Paladin is designed for multi-label settings, the system is flexible and can be adapted to other tasks in single-label settings.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami perkenalkan Paladin, alat anotasi berasaskan web-sumber terbuka untuk mencipta set data berkualiti-tinggi multi-label dokumen. Dengan mengintegrasikan pembelajaran aktif dan pembelajaran proaktif ke tugas anotasi, Paladin membuat tugas itu kurang memakan masa dan memerlukan kurang usaha manusia. Walaupun Paladin direka untuk tetapan label-berbilang, sistem fleksibel dan boleh disesuaikan kepada tugas lain dalam tetapan label-tunggal.', 'mt': 'In this paper, we present Paladin, an open-source web-based annotation tool for creating high-quality multi-label document-level datasets.  By integrating active learning and proactive learning to the annotation task, Paladin makes the task less time-consuming and requiring less human effort.  Although Paladin is designed for multi-label settings, the system is flexible and can be adapted to other tasks in single-label settings.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പാലാദിനെ കാണിക്കുന്നു, ഒരു തുറന്ന വെബ്സോര്\u200dസ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപകരണത്തിനായി കൂടുതല്\u200d വലിയ മാല സജീവമായ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതും പ്രവർത്തികമായ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതും കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതും കൊണ്ട്, പാലാദിന്\u200d സമയം ഉപയോഗി Although Paladin is designed for multi-label settings, the system is flexible and can be adapted to other tasks in single-label settings.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид Паладин-г нээлттэй эх үүсвэртэй веб-суурилсан нээлттэй захирах хэрэгсэл бий болгож байна. Актив суралцах болон сэтгэл хөдлөлийн суралцах үйлдлийг нэгтгэхэд Паладин даалгаварыг цаг хугацааны хэрэглээ багасгаж, хүн төрөлхтний хичээл багасгаж чадна. Паладин олон загварын төлөвлөгөөнд зохион байгуулагдсан ч, систем урт хугацааны бөгөөд нэг загварын төлөвлөгөөнд өөр ажил дээр зохион байж болно.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo Paladin, alat za oznake na internetu otvorenog izvora za stvaranje visokokvalitetnih multi-etiketnih podataka na nivou dokumenta. Integrujući aktivno učenje i proaktivno učenje na zadatak annotacije, Paladin čini zadatak manjim potrošenjem vremena i manjim ljudskim naporima. Iako je Paladin dizajniran za višeetičke postavke, sistem je fleksibilan i može se prilagoditi drugim zadacima u jednostavnim postavkama.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy Paladin, otwarte narzędzie do adnotacji internetowej służące do tworzenia wysokiej jakości wieloznakowych zestawów danych na poziomie dokumentów. Integrując aktywne uczenie się i proaktywne uczenie się do zadania adnotacyjnego, Paladin sprawia, że zadanie jest mniej czasochłonne i wymaga mniejszego wysiłku ludzkiego. Chociaż Paladin jest przeznaczony do ustawień wielu etykiet, system jest elastyczny i może być dostosowany do innych zadań w ustawieniach pojedynczej etykiety.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, vă prezentăm Paladin, un instrument de adnotare web cu sursă deschisă pentru crearea de seturi de date la nivel de documente multi-etichete de înaltă calitate. Prin integrarea învățării active și a învățării proactive în sarcina de adnotare, Paladin face sarcina mai puțin consumatoare de timp și necesită mai puțin efort uman. Deși Paladin este conceput pentru setări cu etichete multiple, sistemul este flexibil și poate fi adaptat la alte sarcini în setări cu etichetă unică.', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaan Paladin ku soo qornaa qalabka macluumaadka ee furan ee web-ka-bannaanta si aad u kala duwan u sameynayso macluumaad-heerka labaad oo kala duduwan. By integrating active learning and proactive learning to the annotation task, Paladin makes the task less time-consuming and requiring less human effort.  In kastoo Paladin loo qoray qorshaha qalabka badan, nidaamka waa fudud yahay, waxaana lagu beddeli karaa shaqooyin kale oo kali ah.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ, අපි පැලාඩින්ව පෙන්වන්නේ, විවෘත ප්\u200dරවෘත වෙබ් අධාරිත වැඩසටහන් විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක්  සක්\u200dරිය ඉගෙනීම සහ ප්\u200dරාක්ෂිය ඉගෙනීම සඳහා ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාවට පලාඩින් කාර්යය අඩු වෙලාවක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න Paladin ගොඩක් ලේබල් සැකසුම් සඳහා සැකසුම් කරලා තියෙනවා නමුත්, පද්ධතිය සැකසුම් සැකසුම් වෙන්න පුළුවන් ඒ වගේම', 'ta': 'இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் பாலாடினை காண்பிக்கிறோம், அதிக தரவு பல- பட்டியல் ஆவண- மட்ட தரவுத்தளங்களை உருவாக்க ஒரு திறந்த மூலம்  செயலில் கற்றல் மற்றும் அறிவிப்பு செயல்படுத்தல் கற்றத்தை ஒன்றாகச் சேர்த்து, பாலாடின் பணியை நேரத்திற்கு முயற்சி குறைவாக ஆக Although Paladin is designed for multi-label settings, the system is flexible and can be adapted to other tasks in single-label settings.', 'sv': 'I den här uppsatsen presenterar vi Paladin, ett webbaserat anteckningsverktyg med öppen källkod för att skapa högkvalitativa dokumentdatauppsättningar med flera etiketter. Genom att integrera aktivt lärande och proaktivt lärande i anteckningsuppgiften gör Paladin uppgiften mindre tidskrävande och kräver mindre mänsklig ansträngning. Även om Paladin är designad för multi-label inställningar, är systemet flexibelt och kan anpassas till andra uppgifter i single-label inställningar.', 'no': 'I denne papiret viser vi Paladin eit opna kjelde-basert notasjonsverktøy for å laga høg kvalitet fleire merkelappe dokumentnivådatasett. Ved å integrere aktiv læring og proaktiv læring til oppgåva for annotasjon, gjer Paladin oppgåva mindre tidsforbruk og krev mindre menneske innsatt. Selv om Paladin er designert for fleire merkelappeinnstillingar, kan systemet fleksibel og tilpassast til andre oppgåver i enkelte merkelappeinnstillingar.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم پالادین کو پیش کریں گے، ایک اوپن-سورس ویب بنیاد رکھا ہوا انٹوریٹ تولیل، بہت سی کیفیت لابل multi-label لابل ڈیٹ سٹ بنانے کے لئے۔ پالادین کے ذریعے فعال تعلیم اور غیرفعال تعلیم کی تعلیم کے ذریعہ ایک دوسرے سے کم زمانہ کھانا اور کم انسان کی تلاش کی ضرورت کرتا ہے۔ Although Paladin is designed for multi-label settings, the system is flexible and can be adapted to other tasks in single-label settings.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda, biz Paladin, juda ko'plab- ko'plab hujjat- darajasi maʼlumot moslamalarini yaratish uchun ochiq- manbasi veb- asosiy taʼminlovchi asbobi. Vazifani tashkilotga aktiv o'rganish va harakat o'rganishni birlashtirish orqali Paladin vazifani vaqt ishlatishni kamaytirish va inson jarayonlarini kamaytirish kerak. @ info", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu Paladin, một công cụ đánh chú web mở để tạo ra các tập tin dữ liệu đa nhãn chất lượng cao. Bằng cách nhập vào công việc học hành và học tập chủ động vào công việc ghi chú, Paladin làm nhiệm vụ giảm thời gian và đòi hỏi ít công sức của con người. Mặc dù Paladin thiết kế cho thiết lập đa nhãn, nhưng hệ thống có thể linh hoạt và thích nghi với các công việc khác trong thiết lập đơn vị.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi Paladin, et open source webbaseret annoteringsværktøj til at skabe højkvalitets multi-label dokumentniveau datasæt. Ved at integrere aktiv læring og proaktiv læring i annotationsopgaven gør Paladin opgaven mindre tidskrævende og kræver mindre menneskelig indsats. Selvom Paladin er designet til multi-label indstillinger, er systemet fleksibelt og kan tilpasses til andre opgaver i single-label indstillinger.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo Paladin, alat za oznake na internetu otvorenog izvora za stvaranje visokokvalitetnih višeoznačenih podataka na nivou dokumenta. Uključujući aktivno učenje i proaktivno učenje na zadatak annotacije, Paladin čini zadatak manjim potrošenjem vremena i manjim ljudskim naporima. Iako je Paladin dizajniran za višeetičke postavke, sustav je fleksibilan i može se prilagoditi drugim zadacima u jednostavnim postavkama.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir Paladin vor, ein Open-Source-webbasiertes Annotations-Tool zur Erstellung hochwertiger Multi-Label-Datensätze auf Dokumentenebene. Durch die Integration von aktivem Lernen und proaktivem Lernen in die Annotationsaufgabe macht Paladin die Aufgabe weniger zeitaufwendig und erfordert weniger menschlichen Aufwand. Obwohl Paladin für Multi-Label-Einstellungen konzipiert ist, ist das System flexibel und kann an andere Aufgaben in Single-Label-Einstellungen angepasst werden.', 'bg': 'В тази статия представяме уеб базиран инструмент за анотация с отворен код за създаване на висококачествени многоетикетни набори от данни на ниво документи. Като интегрира активното учене и проактивното учене към задачата за анотация, Паладин прави задачата по-малко отнемаща време и изисква по-малко човешки усилия. Въпреки че Паладин е проектиран за настройки с няколко етикета, системата е гъвкава и може да бъде адаптирана към други задачи в настройки с един етикет.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we Paladin, een open-source web-based annotatie tool voor het maken van hoogwaardige multi-label document-level datasets. Door actief leren en proactief leren te integreren in de annotatietaak, maakt Paladin de taak minder tijdrovend en vereist minder menselijke inspanning. Hoewel Paladin is ontworpen voor multi-label instellingen, is het systeem flexibel en kan worden aangepast aan andere taken in single-label instellingen.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan Paladin, alat anotasi berasaskan web sumber terbuka untuk menciptakan set data berkualitas tinggi multi-label dokumen. Dengan mengintegrasikan pembelajaran aktif dan pembelajaran proaktif ke tugas anotasi, Paladin membuat tugas itu kurang memakan waktu dan membutuhkan sedikit usaha manusia. Meskipun Paladin dirancang untuk pengaturan multi-label, sistem fleksibel dan dapat diadaptasi ke tugas lain dalam pengaturan single-label.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما پالادین را نشان می دهیم، یک ابزار یادآوری بر روی وب منبع باز برای ایجاد مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای سطح سند\u200cهای زیادی از کیفیت بالا نشان می\u200cدهیم. با جمع آموزش فعالی و آموزش فعالی به کار یادآوری، پالادین کار را کمتر از سوختن زمان و نیاز به تلاش کمتر انسان می\u200cکند. Although Paladin is designed for multi-label settings, the system is flexible and can be adapted to other tasks in single-label settings.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunawasilisha Paladin, nyenzo ya kutangaza kwa kutumia mtandao wa wazi kwa ajili ya kutengeneza seti za taarifa za nyaraka za viwango vya juu. Kwa kuunganisha kujifunza kwa haraka na kujifunza kwa kazi hiyo ya kusisimua, Paladin anafanya kazi isiyo na matumizi ya muda na inahitaji juhudi za binadamu zisizo pungufu. Ingawa Paladin imeundwa kwa ajili ya seti za vifaa vingi, mfumo unaweza kuwa na ubunifu na unaweza kubadilishwa na kazi nyingine katika seti za moja.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim Paladin, një mjet i anotacionit me burim të hapur në internet për krijimin e grupeve të dhënash me cilësi të lartë të nivelit të dokumentit. Duke integruar mësimin aktiv dhe mësimin proaktiv në detyrën e anotacionit, Paladin e bën detyrën më pak kohë dhe kërkon më pak përpjekje njerëzore. Megjithëse Paladin është projektuar për rregullime me shumë etiketa, sistemi është fleksibel dhe mund të përshtatet me detyra të tjera në rregullime me një etiketë të vetme.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 Paladin을 소개했는데 이것은 웹 기반의 소스 오픈 주석 도구로 고품질의 다중 탭 문급 데이터 집합을 만드는 데 사용된다.Paladin은 Active 학습과 Active 학습을 주석 임무에 통합함으로써 임무의 시간 소모와 필요한 인력을 줄였다.성기사는 다중 라벨 설정을 위해 설계되었지만, 이 시스템은 매우 유연하여 단일 라벨 설정 중의 다른 임무에 적응할 수 있다.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ ውስጥ የክፈት የኩነቶች መረጃዎችን ለመፍጠር የክፈት የዌብ አቀማመጥ ማቀናጃ ሀብት Paladin እናቀርባታለን፡፡ በጥያቄ ትምህርት እና ለማስታወቂያ ትምህርት በመቀናቀል፣ ፓላዳን ስራውን በጊዜው የሚያንስ እና የሰው ድጋፍ የሚያስፈልጋት ነው፡፡ Paladin ምንም እንኳ ለብዙ-label settings የተፈጠረ ቢሆንም፣ ሲስተምሩ እየflexible እና ለሌሎች ስራዎችን በአንድ label ማዘጋጀት ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք Պալադինը, բաց կոդը հիմնված վեբ նատորացիայի գործիք, որը ստեղծում է բարձր որակի բազմաթիվ փաստաթղթերի մակարդակի տվյալների համակարգեր: Ինտեգրելով ակտիվ ուսումնասիրությունը և պրոակտիվ ուսումնասիրությունը annoտացիոն խնդրի մեջ, Պալադինը նվազեցնում է աշխատանքը և պահանջում է ավելի քիչ մարդկային ջանքեր: Չնայած Պալադինը նախագծված է բազմաթիկտիկ կարգավորումների համար, համակարգը ճկուն է և կարող է հարմարվել այլ խնդիրներին միաթիկտիկ կարգավորումներում:', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda biz Paladin'i açyk-çeşme web-de buýruk kwalitet multi-etiket sened düzümlerini bejermek üçin hasaplanýan täzelikleri görkeýäris Paladin täsirli öwrenmeleri we aktif öwrenmeleri täzeden geçirýän täzelikleri bilen, günahlary wagtyň tüketmesini azaltýar we adamlaryň çalygyny azaltýar. Paladin birnäçe etiket düzümleri üçin tasarlanýan bolsa hem bu sistem fleksibil we ýeke etiket düzümlerinde başga işlere üýtgebilir.", 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা পালাদিনকে উপস্থাপন করছি একটি উন্মুক্ত উৎসের ওয়েব-ভিত্তিক বিজ্ঞাপন টুল, যা উচ্চ মানুষের মানুষের মাল্টিকে By integrating active learning and proactive learning to the annotation task, Paladin makes the task less time-consuming and requiring less human effort.  যদিও পালাদিন বহুলেবেল বৈশিষ্ট্যের জন্য ডিজাইন করা হয়, তবে সিস্টেম ফ্লিক্সিয়েল এবং একক লেবেল বৈশিষ্ট্যের অন্যান্য কাজের', 'az': "Bu kağızda Paladin'i, yüksək kaliteli çoxlu etiketli səviyyə veri qurğuları yaratmaq üçün açıq-kaynak web tabanlı bilgilər vasitəsilə göstəririk. Etkili öyrənmək və proaktiv öyrənmək işinə birləşdirərək Paladin vəzifəni daha az zaman istifadə edir və daha az insan çabalarına ehtiyac edir. Paladin çoxlu etiketli quruluşlar üçün tasarlanmış olsa da, sistem fleksibildir və yalnız etiketli quruluşlarda başqa işlərə uyğunlanabilir.", 'af': "In hierdie papier, laat ons Paladin voorsien, 'n open-bron web-gebaseerde annotasie hulpmiddel vir skep van hoë-kwaliteit multi-label dokument-vlak datastel. Deur aktiewe leer en proaktiewe leer te integreer tot die annotasie taak, maak Paladin die taak minder tyd-verbruik en benodig minder menslike versoek. Alhoewel Paladin is ontwerp vir veelvuldige etiket instellings, is die stelsel fleksibel en kan aan ander opdragte in enkele etiket instellings aanpas word.", 'ca': "En aquest article presentem Paladin, una eina d'anotació de codi obert basada en la Web per crear conjunts de dades multietiquetats de gran qualitat a nivell documental. By integrating active learning and proactive learning to the annotation task, Paladin makes the task less time-consuming and requiring less human effort.  Encara que Paladin està dissenyat per configuracions multietiquetades, el sistema és flexible i pot adaptar-se a altres tasques en configuracions unietiquetades.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustame Paladini, avatud lähtekoodiga veebipõhist märgistamisvahendit kvaliteetsete mitme märgisega dokumenditasemel andmekogumite loomiseks. Aktiivse õppe ja proaktiivse õppe integreerimisega märgistusülesandesse muudab Paladin ülesande vähem aeganõudvaks ja nõuab vähem inimlikku pingutust. Kuigi Paladin on mõeldud mitme sildi seadete jaoks, on süsteem paindlik ja seda saab kohandada muude ülesannetega ühe sildi seadetes.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään Paladin, avoimen lähdekoodin verkkopohjainen huomautustyökalu korkealaatuisten monitasoisten dokumenttitason aineistojen luomiseen. Yhdistämällä aktiivisen oppimisen ja ennakoivan oppimisen muistiinpanotehtävään Paladin tekee tehtävästä vähemmän aikaa vievää ja inhimillistä työtä vaativaa. Vaikka Paladin on suunniteltu usean tarran asetuksiin, järjestelmä on joustava ja voidaan mukauttaa muihin tehtäviin yhden tarran asetuksissa.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo Paladin, alat za oznake na internetu otvorenog izvora za stvaranje visokokvalitetnih multi-etiketnih podataka na nivou dokumenta. Uključujući aktivno učenje i proaktivno učenje na zadatak annotacije, Paladin čini zadatak manjim potrošenjem vremena i manjim ljudskim naporima. Iako je Paladin dizajniran za višeetičke postavke, sistem je fleksibilan i može se prilagoditi drugim zadacima u jednostavnim postavkama.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme Paladin, open-source web-based anotace nástroj pro vytváření vysoce kvalitních multi-label datových sad na úrovni dokumentů. Integrací aktivního učení a proaktivního učení do anotace úkolu zajišťuje Paladin méně časově náročný úkol a vyžaduje menší lidské úsilí. Přestože je Paladin navržen pro nastavení více štítků, systém je flexibilní a lze ho přizpůsobit jiným úkolům v nastavení s jedním štítkem.', 'jv': 'Nang pemilit iki, kita mulai paliin, Open-source web-basa alat kanggo nggawe dataset sing apik-kalit multi-label dokumen-evel Ngawe jenis-jenis layang lan ijol-ijolan layang kanggo tinggal nggawe gerakan kanggo awak dhéwé, paliin kuwi nggawe layang kuwi ora ono wektu nggawe nguasal sapa-sapa uwis. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo Paladin, odprtokodno spletno orodje za pripombe za ustvarjanje visokokakovostnih večoznačnih zbirk podatkov na ravni dokumentov. Z vključitvijo aktivnega učenja in proaktivnega učenja v nalogo označevanja Paladin naredi nalogo manj zamudno in zahteva manj človeškega truda. Čeprav je Paladin zasnovan za nastavitve več oznak, je sistem prilagodljiv in ga je mogoče prilagoditi drugim opravilom v nastavitvah ene oznake.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים את פאלדין, כלי ציונים מבוסס באינטרנט מקור פתוח לייצור קבוצות נתונים ברמה מסמכים רבות איכות גבוהה. על ידי האינגרציה של לימוד פעיל וללמד פרואקטיבי למשימת הערות, פאלדין הופך את המשימה לפחות לוקחת זמן ולדרוש פחות מאמץ אנושי. Although Paladin is designed for multi-label settings, the system is flexible and can be adapted to other tasks in single-label settings.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da Paedan, wata zanar zartar zartar da zane-zane mai banga ɗabi'a zuwa-bangon, dõmin ya ƙiƙira tsarin takardar-daraja mai girma-nau'i. Ga ta haɗa da shirin da aka karanta masu haraka da aka sanar da shi zuwa aikin mai sanarwa, Paedan yana da aikin kafin da za'a yi amfani da lokaci kuma yana da aikin mutum ƙaranci. Akwai da aka ƙayyade Padaman wa daidaita ko-label masu yawa, ya zama mai lokaci kuma ana iya adadi zuwa wasu aikin da ke cikin daidaita ɗabi'a.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་པེ་ལཱལ་ཌིན་ནི་ཁ་ཕྱེས སྙུགས་སྙད་པ་དང་ལས་དུས་ལ་སྦྲེལ་བའི་ཤེས་ཚད་ལ་བསྡད་དགོས་པ་ལས། Paladin་ནི་ལྟ་བུའི་དུས་ཚོད་ལས་ཕར་ལེན་བསྐྱེད་དུ་འཇ Although Paladin is designed for multi-label settings, the system is flexible and can be adapted to other tasks in single-label settings.'}
{'en': 'Story Centaur : Large Language Model Few Shot Learning as a Creative Writing Tool', 'ar': 'قصة القنطور: نموذج لغة كبير قليل من التعلم بالرصاص كأداة كتابة إبداعية', 'es': 'Story Centaur: Modelo de lenguaje grande Few Shot Learning como herramienta de escritura creativa', 'fr': "Story Centaur\xa0: Large Language Model L'apprentissage en quelques coups comme outil d'écriture créative", 'pt': 'Centauro de História: Modelo de Linguagem Grande Aprendizagem de Poucos Tiros como uma Ferramenta de Escrita Criativa', 'zh': '故事半人马座:大言少学为器', 'ja': 'ストーリーケンタウロス：大規模言語モデル創造的な書き込みツールとしての少ないショット学習', 'hi': 'कहानी Centaur: बड़ी भाषा मॉडल कुछ शॉट एक रचनात्मक लेखन उपकरण के रूप में सीखना', 'ru': 'Story Centaur: Large Language Model Few Shot Learning as a Creative Writing Tool', 'ga': 'Story Centaur: Samhail Mhór Theanga Is beag an Fhoghlaim mar Uirlis Scríbhneoireacht Chruthaitheach', 'ka': 'Story Centaur: დიდი ენის მოდელი ცოტა შესწავლება როგორც შექმნა წერის ხელსაწყო', 'hu': 'Történet Kentaur: Nagy nyelvi modell Kevés lövés tanulás, mint kreatív író eszköz', 'kk': 'Журнал центрасы: Үлкен тіл үлгісі Жазу құралы ретінде оқыту үлкен қысқа жазу үлгісі', 'lt': 'Story Centaur: Large Language Model Few Shots Learning as a Creative Writing Tool', 'mk': 'Story Centaur: Large Language Model Few Shot Learning as a Creative Writing Tool', 'ms': 'Pusat Stori: Model Bahasa Besar Beberapa Tembakan Belajar sebagai Alat Penulisan Kreatif', 'ml': 'സ്റ്റോറി സെന്\u200dറ്റര്\u200d: വലിയ ഭാഷ മോഡേല്\u200d കുറച്ചു ഷോട്ട് പഠിക്കുന്നു. സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്ന എഴുതുന്ന പണി', 'el': 'Κένταυρος Ιστορίας: Μεγάλο Γλωσσικό Μοντέλο Λίγες Σφηνάκια Μάθηση ως Δημιουργικό Εργαλείο Γραφής', 'mt': 'Ċentatur tal-Story: Il-Mudell tal-Lingwa l-Kbar ftit Tagħlim bil-Ħruġ bħala Għodda Kreattiva għall-Kiri', 'it': 'Story Centaur: Grande modello linguistico Pochi colpi di apprendimento come strumento di scrittura creativa', 'mn': 'Түүх Центаур: Том хэл загвар Бага Сургуулалт Бүтээлч бичих хэрэгсэл гэж суралцах', 'no': 'Storleik', 'ro': 'Povestea Centaur: Model de limbă mare puține fotografii de învățare ca instrument de scriere creativă', 'pl': 'Story Centaur: Duży model językowy Kilka strzałów uczenia się jako kreatywne narzędzie do pisania', 'sr': 'Centaur priče: Veliki jezički model manje pucanja učenje kao kreativni napisač', 'si': 'කතාව Centaur: ලොකු භාෂාව මොඩල් ටිකක් විදියට සිරීම් ලිපින් උපකරණය විදියට ඉගෙනීම', 'sv': 'Story Centaur: Stor språkmodell Få skott lärande som ett kreativt skrivverktyg', 'so': 'Toy Centaur: Model Model Few Shot Learning as a Creative Writing Tool', 'ta': 'பெரிய மொழி மாதிரி குறைந்த காட்சி கற்றுக் கொண்டிருப்பதை உருவாக்கும் எழுதும் கருவி', 'ur': 'داستان سنٹور: بڑی زبان موڈل کم شٹ سیکھنے کے لئے مخلوقات لیکن تولید کے طور پر', 'uz': 'Qidirish markazi:', 'vi': 'Chương trình Centauri: Bản phát ngôn rộng Mô hình ngắn ảnh học về văn học sáng tạo', 'hr': 'Priča Centaur: Veliki jezički model manje pucanja učenje kao kreativni napisni alat', 'bg': 'История Кентавър: Голям езиков модел с няколко снимки учене като творчески инструмент за писане', 'da': 'Story Centaur: Stor sprogmodel Få skudt læring som et kreativt skriveværktøj', 'de': 'Story Centaur: Großes Sprachmodell Weniger Schuss Lernen als kreatives Schreibwerkzeug', 'id': 'Centaur Story: Model Bahasa Besar Beberapa Tembakan Belajar sebagai Alat Penulisan Kreatif', 'nl': 'Verhaal Centaur: Groot Taalmodel Weinig schot Leren als een Creatief Schrijfgereedschap', 'sw': 'Kituo cha hadithi: Modeli kubwa ya Lugha Chache Kujifunza kama Kifaa cha Kuandika kwa Ubunifu', 'tr': 'Geçmiş Centaur: Ullakan Dil Modeli Beýik Taze ýazma Aracı olara öwrenmek', 'fa': 'سنتور داستان: مدل زبان بزرگ کمی یادگیری به عنوان ابزار نوشتن آفریننده', 'ko': '이야기 켄타우로스 자리: 대형 언어 모형 소렌즈 학습을 창조적인 창작 도구로 삼다', 'af': "Story Centaur: Groot Taal Model Few Shot Leer as 'n Skep Skrifgereedskap", 'sq': 'Qendra e tregimeve: Modeli i madh i gjuhës Mësohet pak si një mjet krijues shkrimi', 'am': 'ታሪክ', 'hy': 'Պատմության կենտրոն: Large լեզվի մոդել Few shot սովորելը որպես ստեղծագործական գրողական գործիք', 'az': 'Hikay톛 Centaur: B칲y칲k Dil Modeli K칲칞칲k Dil 칐yr톛nm톛si yarat캼c캼 Yaz캼m Arac캼 olaraq', 'ca': "Story Centaur: L'aprenentatge amb pocs tiros de models de llenguatge grans com una eina d'escriptura creativa", 'bs': 'Priča Centaur: Veliki jezički model manje pucanja učenje kao kreativni napisač', 'bn': 'স্টোরি সেন্টার: বড় ভাষা মোডেল ক্রিয়েটিভ লেখক টুল হিসেবে শিক্ষা প্রদান করা হচ্ছে', 'et': 'Story Centaur: suur keelemudel vähe pilti õppimine loomingulise kirjutamise vahendina', 'cs': 'Příběh Centaur: Velký jazyk Model Málo záběrů učení jako kreativní psací nástroj', 'fi': 'Story Centaur: Suuri kielimalli Muutaman kuvan oppiminen luovana kirjoitustyökaluna', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Zgodba Centaur: Veliki jezikovni model Nekaj posnetkov učenje kot ustvarjalno orodje pisanja', 'he': 'סיפור מרכז: דוגמנית שפה גדולה ללמוד כמה יריות ככלי כתיבה יצירתית', 'bo': 'Story Centaur: Large Language Model Few Shot Learning as a Creative Writing Tool', 'jv': 'Peringatan Centur: Normal Language model Few shot Learning as a Creatve Writing Tool'}
{'en': 'Few shot learning with large language models has the potential to give individuals without formal machine learning training the access to a wide range of text to text models. We consider how this applies to creative writers and present Story Centaur, a user interface for prototyping few shot models and a set of recombinable web components that deploy them. Story Centaur’s goal is to expose creative writers to few shot learning with a simple but powerful interface that lets them compose their own co-creation tools that further their own unique artistic directions. We build out several examples of such tools, and in the process probe the boundaries and issues surrounding generation with large language models.', 'ar': 'قليل من التعلم باستخدام نماذج اللغة الكبيرة لديه القدرة على منح الأفراد الذين ليس لديهم تدريب رسمي على التعلم الآلي إمكانية الوصول إلى مجموعة كبيرة من النصوص إلى النماذج النصية. نحن نأخذ في الاعتبار كيف ينطبق هذا على الكتاب المبدعين ونقدم Story Centaur ، واجهة مستخدم لنماذج أولية لبعض نماذج اللقطات ومجموعة من مكونات الويب القابلة لإعادة الدمج التي تنشرها. هدف Story Centaur هو تعريض الكتاب المبدعين لقليل من التعلم بالرصاص بواجهة بسيطة ولكنها قوية تسمح لهم بتكوين أدوات الإبداع المشترك الخاصة بهم التي تعزز اتجاهاتهم الفنية الفريدة. نقوم ببناء العديد من الأمثلة على هذه الأدوات ، وفي هذه العملية نتحرى الحدود والقضايا المحيطة بالجيل باستخدام نماذج اللغة الكبيرة.', 'es': 'El aprendizaje de pocas tomas con modelos lingüísticos grandes tiene el potencial de dar a las personas sin una formación formal de aprendizaje automático el acceso a una amplia gama de modelos de texto a texto. Consideramos cómo esto se aplica a los escritores creativos y presentamos Story Centaur, una interfaz de usuario para crear prototipos de modelos de pocos planos y un conjunto de componentes web recombinables que los despliegan. El objetivo de Story Centaur es exponer a los escritores creativos a un aprendizaje de pocas tomas con una interfaz simple pero potente que les permita componer sus propias herramientas de co-creación que fomenten sus propias direcciones artísticas únicas. Creamos varios ejemplos de tales herramientas y, en el proceso, analizamos los límites y los problemas que rodean a la generación con grandes modelos lingüísticos.', 'pt': 'Poucos tiros de aprendizado com grandes modelos de linguagem têm o potencial de dar aos indivíduos sem treinamento formal de aprendizado de máquina o acesso a uma ampla variedade de modelos de texto para texto. Consideramos como isso se aplica a escritores criativos e apresentamos o Story Centaur, uma interface de usuário para prototipagem de alguns modelos de tomadas e um conjunto de componentes da web recombináveis que os implantam. O objetivo do Story Centaur é expor escritores criativos a um aprendizado de poucos tiros com uma interface simples, mas poderosa, que lhes permite compor suas próprias ferramentas de cocriação que promovem suas próprias direções artísticas exclusivas. Construímos vários exemplos de tais ferramentas e, no processo, sondamos os limites e questões que cercam a geração com grandes modelos de linguagem.', 'fr': "Peu d'apprentissage instantané avec de grands modèles linguistiques ont le potentiel de donner aux personnes sans formation formelle en apprentissage automatique l'accès à un large éventail de modèles texte à texte. Nous examinons comment cela s'applique aux auteurs créatifs et présentons Story Centaur, une interface utilisateur permettant de prototyper quelques modèles de plans et un ensemble de composants Web recombinables qui les déploient. L'objectif de Story Centaur est d'exposer les auteurs créatifs à quelques plans d'apprentissage grâce à une interface simple mais puissante qui leur permet de composer leurs propres outils de co-création qui renforcent leurs propres directions artistiques uniques. Nous élaborons plusieurs exemples de tels outils et, ce faisant, nous explorons les limites et les problèmes liés à la génération à l'aide de grands modèles linguistiques.", 'zh': '希有大言射学,或使无正机器习者得访诸文本。 思所以创意作者,并言Story Centaur,一以原型为少镜头用户界面及部署其重组Web组件。 Story Centaur者,以约而功能强大界面使创意者接镜头学,使造作之具,推独行之方。 构此数示例,穷其语言。', 'ru': 'Немногочисленное изучение языков с помощью больших языковых моделей может предоставить людям без формального обучения машинному обучению доступ к широкому спектру текстовых моделей. Мы рассматриваем, как это относится к творческим писателям и презентуем Story Centaur, пользовательский интерфейс для прототипирования нескольких моделей снимков и набор рекомбинируемых веб-компонентов, которые их развертывают. Цель Story Centaur заключается в том, чтобы подвергнуть творческих писателей малому обучению с помощью простого, но мощного интерфейса, который позволяет им создавать свои собственные инструменты совместного творчества, которые развивают их собственные уникальные художественные направления. Мы строим несколько примеров таких инструментов, и в процессе исследуем границы и проблемы, окружающие поколение с большими языковыми моделями.', 'hi': 'बड़ी भाषा मॉडल के साथ कुछ शॉट सीखने में औपचारिक मशीन लर्निंग प्रशिक्षण के बिना व्यक्तियों को पाठ मॉडल तक पाठ की एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला तक पहुंच प्रदान करने की क्षमता है। हम विचार करते हैं कि यह रचनात्मक लेखकों और वर्तमान स्टोरी सेंटॉर पर कैसे लागू होता है, जो कुछ शॉट मॉडलों को प्रोटोटाइप करने के लिए एक उपयोगकर्ता इंटरफ़ेस और उन्हें तैनात करने वाले पुन: संयोजन योग्य वेब घटकों का एक सेट है। कहानी Centaur का लक्ष्य रचनात्मक लेखकों को एक सरल लेकिन शक्तिशाली इंटरफ़ेस के साथ कुछ शॉट सीखने के लिए बेनकाब करना है जो उन्हें अपने स्वयं के सह-निर्माण उपकरणों की रचना करने देता है जो अपने स्वयं के अद्वितीय कलात्मक दिशाओं को आगे बढ़ाते हैं। हम इस तरह के उपकरणों के कई उदाहरणों का निर्माण करते हैं, और इस प्रक्रिया में बड़े भाषा मॉडल के साथ पीढ़ी के आसपास की सीमाओं और मुद्दों की जांच करते हैं।', 'ja': '大規模な言語モデルを使用したショット学習には、正式な機械学習トレーニングを受けていない個人に、幅広いテキストからテキストモデルへのアクセスを提供する可能性がほとんどありません。これがクリエイティブライターにどのように適用されるかを検討し、ストーリーケンタウロス、いくつかのショットモデルをプロトタイプ化するためのユーザーインターフェース、およびそれらを展開する組み換え可能なWebコンポーネントのセットを提示します。ストーリーケンタウロスの目標は、独自のアーティスティックな方向性をさらに進めるための共創ツールを作成できるシンプルで強力なインターフェースで、クリエイティブなライターを数少ないショット学習にさらすことです。私たちはそのようなツールのいくつかの例を構築し、その過程で大規模な言語モデルで生成を取り巻く境界と問題を探る。', 'ga': 'Is beag an fhoghlaim lámhaigh le múnlaí móra teanga a d’fhéadfadh rochtain a thabhairt do dhaoine aonair nach bhfuil oiliúint fhoirmiúil meaisínfhoghlama acu ar raon leathan samhlacha téacs go téacs. Déanaimid machnamh ar an gcaoi a mbaineann sé seo le scríbhneoirí cruthaitheacha agus cuirimid i láthair Story Centaur, comhéadan úsáideora chun cúpla samhail lámhaigh a fhréamhshamhlú agus sraith de chomhpháirteanna gréasáin in-ath-inchurtha a imlonnaítear iad. Is é an sprioc atá ag Story Centaur ná scríbhneoirí cruthaitheacha a nochtadh d’fhoghlaim bheag lámhaigh le comhéadan simplí ach cumhachtach a ligeann dóibh a n-uirlisí comhchruthaithe féin a chumadh a chuireann a dtreonna uathúla ealaíne féin chun cinn. Tógaimid amach roinnt samplaí d’uirlisí dá leithéid, agus sa phróiseas déanaimid iniúchadh ar na teorainneacha agus na saincheisteanna a bhaineann le giniúint le mionsamhlacha teanga.', 'ka': 'პატარა სისტემის მედელთან უკეთესი სისტემის მოდელთან შესაძლებელია, რომ ადამიანებს ფორმალური მანქანის გასწავლების შესაძლებლობა ტექსტის მედელთან უფრო დიდ სისტე ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ, როგორ ეს კრეატიური წერილებისთვის და ახლა ისტორის ცენტორის მომხმარებელი ინტერფექტი, რომელიც პროტოტიპის ნომელეტების მოდელეტებისთვის და გადაყენებული ვებ კ ისტორიის მიზეზი არის კრეატიური წერილებების გამოყენება რამდენიმე სტრიქტიური სწავლებისთვის მარტივი, მაგრამ ძალიან ინტერფექტიური ინტერფექტის გამოყენება, რომელიც ისინი შექმნას ჩვენ რამდენიმე მაგალითად ასეთი ხელსაწყობილობის მაგალითად შევქმნით და პროცესში შევცვალოთ დროები და პრობლემები, რომლებიც უფრო დიდ ენახის მოდელ', 'hu': 'A nagyméretű nyelvi modellekkel végzett kevés lövéses tanulás lehetőséget biztosít arra, hogy formális gépi tanulás nélkül az egyének számára hozzáférést biztosítson a szöveg és a szöveg modellek széles skálájához. Figyelembe vesszük, hogy ez hogyan vonatkozik a kreatív írókra, és bemutatjuk a Story Centaur felhasználói felületet, amely néhány fotós modell prototípusához és egy sor rekombinálható webkomponenshez, amelyek telepítik őket. Story Centaur célja, hogy a kreatív írókat kevés lövéses tanulásnak tegye ki egy egyszerű, de erőteljes felülettel, amely lehetővé teszi számukra, hogy saját egyedi művészi irányaikat elősegítő közös alkotási eszközeiket alkossanak. Ezekre az eszközökre számos példát építünk, és a folyamat során nagy nyelvi modellekkel vizsgáljuk a generációt körülvevő határokat és problémákat.', 'el': 'Λίγη εκμάθηση με μεγάλα γλωσσικά μοντέλα έχει τη δυνατότητα να δώσει σε άτομα χωρίς επίσημη εκπαίδευση μηχανικής μάθησης την πρόσβαση σε ένα ευρύ φάσμα προτύπων κειμένου σε κείμενο. Εξετάζουμε πώς αυτό ισχύει για τους δημιουργικούς συγγραφείς και παρουσιάζουμε το ένα περιβάλλον χρήστη για τη δημιουργία πρωτοτύπων μερικών μοντέλων λήψης και ένα σύνολο ανασυνδυόμενων στοιχείων ιστού που τα αναπτύσσουν. Στόχος του Κένταυρου είναι να εκθέσει τους δημιουργικούς συγγραφείς στην εκμάθηση ελάχιστων στιγμών με μια απλή αλλά ισχυρή διεπαφή που τους επιτρέπει να συνθέσουν τα δικά τους εργαλεία συν-δημιουργίας που προωθούν τις δικές τους μοναδικές καλλιτεχνικές κατευθύνσεις. Κατασκευάζουμε αρκετά παραδείγματα τέτοιων εργαλείων και κατά τη διάρκεια της διαδικασίας διερευνούμε τα όρια και τα ζητήματα που περιβάλλουν τη δημιουργία με μεγάλα γλωσσικά μοντέλα.', 'it': "Pochi shot learning con modelli linguistici di grandi dimensioni hanno il potenziale di dare agli individui senza formazione formale di apprendimento automatico l'accesso a una vasta gamma di modelli di testo a testo. Consideriamo come questo si applichi agli scrittori creativi e presentiamo Story Centaur, un'interfaccia utente per la prototipazione di alcuni modelli shot e un set di componenti web ricombinabili che li implementano. L'obiettivo di Centaur è quello di esporre gli scrittori creativi a pochi scatti di apprendimento con un'interfaccia semplice ma potente che consente loro di comporre i propri strumenti di co-creazione che promuovono le proprie direzioni artistiche uniche. Costruiamo diversi esempi di tali strumenti, e nel processo sondiamo i confini e le questioni che circondano la generazione con modelli linguistici di grandi dimensioni.", 'kk': 'Ең үлкен тіл үлгілері арқылы білім оқыту мүмкіндігі көп мәтін үлгілеріне көптеген мәтін үлгілеріне қатынау мүмкіндігі бар. Біз бұл құрастырушы жазушыларға қалай қолданылады және түсінікті Centaur, бірнеше шарт моделдерін прототификациялау үшін пайдаланушылардың интерфейсі және оларды жасайтын веб компоненттерінің бірнеше комп Centaur жазуының мақсаты - құрастырмалы жазушыларды бірнеше қарапайым, бірақ күшті интерфейсі арқылы оқытуға көмектесетін, олар өзінің біріктіру құрылғыларын құруға мүмкіндік береді. Олар ө Біз бұл құралдардың бірнеше мысалдарын құрамыз, және процестің шектерін және үлкен тіл үлгілерімен құрамындағы мәселелерді зерттеу.', 'lt': 'Nedidelis mokymasis dideliais kalbų modeliais gali suteikti asmenims be formalaus mašininio mokymo galimybę susipažinti su įvairiais teksto modeliais. We consider how this applies to creative writers and present Story Centaur, a user interface for prototyping few shot models and a set of recombinable web components that deploy them.  Story Centaur tikslas – parodyti kūrybingus rašytojus keliems fotografiniams mokymuisi su paprasta, bet galinga s ąsaja, leidžiančia jiems kurti savo pačių bendro kūrimo priemones, kurios skatina savo unikalias menines kryptis. Mes parengiame kelis tokių priemonių pavyzdžius ir procese ištiriame su didelėmis kalbomis susijusias kartos ribas ir problemas.', 'mk': 'Few shot learning with large language models has the potential to give individuals without formal machine learning training the access to a wide range of text to text models.  Размислуваме како ова се однесува на креативните писатели и претставуваме Story Centaur, кориснички интерфејс за прототип на неколку снимки модели и сет рекомбинабилни веб компоненти кои ги распоредуваат. Целта на Приказната Центаур е да ги изложи креативните писатели на неколку снимки на учење со едноставен, но моќен интерфејс кој им овозможува да создадат сопствени алатки за сокреација кои ги продолжуваат своите уникатни уметнички насоки. Создаваме неколку примери на вакви алатки и во процесот ги истражуваме границите и прашањата околу генерацијата со големи јазички модели.', 'ms': 'Beberapa penembak belajar dengan model bahasa besar mempunyai potensi untuk memberikan individu tanpa pelatihan mesin rasmi akses ke julat luas teks ke model teks. Kami mempertimbangkan bagaimana ini berlaku kepada penulis kreatif dan mempersembahkan Story Centaur, antaramuka pengguna untuk prototip beberapa model tembakan dan set komponen web yang boleh digabungkan. Tujuan Story Centaur adalah untuk mengekspos penulis kreatif kepada beberapa penembak belajar dengan antaramuka mudah tetapi kuat yang membolehkan mereka membuat alat ciptaan mereka sendiri yang melanjutkan arah seni unik mereka sendiri. Kami membina beberapa contoh alat-alat tersebut, dan dalam proses menyelidiki sempadan dan isu-isu yang mengelilingi generasi dengan model bahasa yang besar.', 'mn': 'Томоохон хэл загвараар суралцах бага шат суралцах нь официально машин суралцах боломжгүй хүмүүст текст загвар руу олон хэсэгт хүрэх боломжтой байдаг. Бид үүнийг бүтээлч зохиолчдын хувьд хэрхэн хэрэглэгддэг вэб компонентүүд болон түүх центаурын хувьд хэрэглэгчийн интерфейс гэж бодож байна. Центаурын зорилго гэвэл бүтээлч зохиолчдыг энгийн, хүчирхэг интерфейсээр суралцах хэд хэдэн зурагт суралцах нь өөрсдийн хамтран бүтээлч хэрэгсэл боловсруулах боломжтой. Бид эдгээр хэрэгслүүдийн олон жишээг бий болгосон. Процесс дээр үеийн эргэн тойрны хил хязгаарыг, асуудлуудыг том хэл загвартай судалдаг.', 'ml': 'വലിയ ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളോടൊപ്പം പഠിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d വളരെ കുറച്ചു വെടിവാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് ഫോളില്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പഠിക്കാതെ വ്യക്തികള്\u200dക്ക് പ സൃഷ്ടികരായ എഴുത്തുകാര്\u200dക്കും, സ്റ്റോര്\u200d സെന്റ്റര്\u200dക്കും ഇത് എങ്ങനെയാണ് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നതെന്നും നമുക്ക് വിചാരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ഉപയോക്താവ്  സ്റ്റോര്\u200d സെന്\u200dറ്ററിന്\u200dറെ ലക്ഷ്യം സൃഷ്ടികരായ എഴുത്തുകാര്\u200dക്ക് വെളിപ്പെടുത്തിക്കൊടുക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു ലളിതമായ, ശക്തിയുള ഇത്തരം ഉപകരണങ്ങളുടെ പല ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d നാം ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d അതിരുകളും പ്രശ്നങ്ങളും വളരെ ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളുമായി ചുറ്റ', 'mt': "It-tagħlim żgħir b’mudelli kbar tal-lingwi għandu l-potenzjal li jagħti lill-individwi mingħajr taħriġ formali bil-magni a ċċess għal firxa wiesgħa ta’ testi għal mudelli tat-test. We consider how this applies to creative writers and present Story Centaur, a user interface for prototyping few shot models and a set of recombinable web components that deploy them.  Story Centaur's goal is to expose creative writers to few shot learning with a simple but powerful interface that lets them compose their own co-creation tools that further their own unique artistic directions.  Aħna nibnu diversi eżempji ta’ għodod bħal dawn, u fil-proċess in ħarsu l-fruntieri u l-kwistjonijiet madwar il-ġenerazzjoni b’mudelli lingwistiċi kbar.", 'no': 'Få bilete læring med store språk-modeller har det mogleg å gje individuane utan formelt maskinelæring av tilgang til ein stor område av tekst til tekstmodeller. Vi ser på korleis dette appliserer til kreative brennar og presenterer storleik Centaur, eit brukargrensesnitt for prototyping av få fotomodeller og eit sett av rekombinable nettkomponentar som utviklar dei. Målet for historien Centaur er å eksponera kreative brennar til få bilete læring med ein enkel, men kraftig grensesnitt som lèt dei lage sine eige samarbeidsverktøya som forbetrar sine eige unike artistiske retningar. Vi bygger ut fleire eksemplar av slike verktøy, og i prosessen prøver grensene og problemar som omkriver generering med stor språk-modeller.', 'ro': 'Puține învățături cu modele lingvistice mari au potențialul de a oferi persoanelor fără instruire formală de învățare automată accesul la o gamă largă de modele text la text. Considerăm modul în care acest lucru se aplică scriitorilor creativi și prezentăm Story Centaur, o interfață de utilizator pentru prototiparea câtorva modele shot și un set de componente web recombinabile care le implementează. Scopul Centaur este de a expune scriitorii creativi la puține învățături filmate cu o interfață simplă, dar puternică, care le permite să compună propriile instrumente de co-creatie care să-și promoveze propriile direcții artistice unice. Construim mai multe exemple de astfel de instrumente și, în acest proces, sondăm limitele și problemele din jurul generației cu modele lingvistice mari.', 'sr': 'Malo pucnjave na učenje velikim jezičkim modelima ima potencijal da daju pojedincima bez formalnog mašinskog učenja pristup širom raspona teksta do tekstskih modela. Razmišljamo o tome kako se to odnosi na kreativne pisace i predstavlja Centaur priče, korisnički interfejs za prototipiranje nekoliko modela snimanja i setu rekombinabilnih mrežnih komponenata koje ih razvijaju. Cilj priče Centaur a je otkrivanje kreativnih pisaca nekoliko pucnjava na učenje jednostavnom, ali moćnom interfejsu koji im omogućava da sastave sopstvene alate za saradnju koji dalje svoja jedinstvena umetnička uputa. Izgradili smo nekoliko primjera takvih alata, i u procesu istražujemo granice i probleme oko generacije sa velikim jezičkim modelima.', 'pl': 'Niewiele osób, które nie mają formalnego szkolenia w zakresie uczenia się maszynowego, ma potencjał zapewnić osobom bez formalnego szkolenia w zakresie uczenia się maszynowego dostępu do szerokiej gamy modeli tekstowych i tekstowych. Rozważamy, w jaki sposób ma to zastosowanie do autorów kreatywnych i przedstawiamy Story Centaur, interfejs użytkownika do prototypowania kilku modeli zdjęć oraz zestaw rekombinowalnych komponentów internetowych, które je wdrażają. Celem Story Centaur jest narażenie twórczych pisarzy na naukę kilku strzałów za pomocą prostego, ale potężnego interfejsu, który pozwala im komponować własne narzędzia współtworzenia, które poszerzają ich własne unikalne kierunki artystyczne. Budujemy kilka przykładów takich narzędzi, a w procesie badamy granice i zagadnienia związane z generacją dużymi modelami językowymi.', 'si': 'ලොකු භාෂා මොඩල් එක්ක ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විදියට පුළුවන් විදියට පුළුවන් විදියට පුළුවන් විදියට පරික අපි හිතන්නේ කොහොමද මේක නිර්මාණික ලේඛකයෝ සහ කතාව සෙන්ටෝර්, ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වින්\u200dයාපිත වින්\u200dයාපිත වින්\u200dයාපිත වින්යා සෙන්ටෝර්ගේ අරක්ෂණය තමයි නිර්මාණක ලේඛකයන්ට සිද්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ සරල නමුත් ශක්තිමත් අන්තර්ජනයෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප අපි ඒ වගේ උදාහරණ වගේ උදාහරණ වලින් ගොඩක් උදාහරණ නිර්මාණය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම පරීක්ෂණයේ සීමාව සහ ප්\u200dරශ්න', 'sv': 'Få skottinlärning med stora språkmodeller har potential att ge individer utan formell maskininlärningsträning tillgång till ett brett utbud av text till textmodeller. Vi överväger hur detta gäller kreativa författare och presenterar Story Centaur, ett användargränssnitt för prototypning av några skottmodeller och en uppsättning rekombinerbara webbkomponenter som distribuerar dem. Story Centaurs mål är att utsätta kreativa författare för få skott lärande med ett enkelt men kraftfullt gränssnitt som låter dem komponera sina egna verktyg för samskapande som främjar sina egna unika konstnärliga riktningar. Vi bygger upp flera exempel på sådana verktyg och undersöker i processen gränserna och frågorna kring generation med stora språkmodeller.', 'so': 'Waxbarashada suurtagal ah oo aad ku baraneyso tusaale ahaan luuqadaha waaweyn waxay awoodaa in qofka la siiyo mashiinka rasmi ah oo aan la baran karo waxbarashada kaalmada qoraalka oo kala duduwan. Waxaynu ka fiirsanaynaa sida ay taasu ugu habboon karto qoraal abuuri kara oo u soo wadata Story Centaur, qaabka isticmaalayaasha tusaalayaal yar oo ganacsi ah iyo qaab kamid ah bogga internetka oo la soo celin karo. Hadalka Centaur waxaa la jeedaa in la muujiyo qoraal abuuri karo in ay wax ku baraan iskuul yar laakiin aad u xoog badan, taas oo u oggolayso in ay samaystaan qalabka iskaashatada, kuwaas oo ka sii wadata hagitaanka farshaxanka gaarka ah. Waxaannu dhisnaa tusaalooyin badan oo qalabkaas ah, marka lagu jiro waxaan sameynaa xuduudaha iyo arimaha qarniga ku wareegsan samooyin luuqada waaweyn leh.', 'ta': 'பெரிய மொழி மாதிரிகளுடன் கற்றுக் கொள்ள சில ஷூட்டுகள் சாத்தியம் உள்ளது உரை மாதிரிகளுக்கு உரையின் அணுகல் பயிற்சி பெறுவதற்கு  நாம் எவ்வாறு இது படைப்பான எழுத்தாளர்களுக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது மற்றும் தற்போதைய Story Centaur, சில ஷூட் மாதிரிகளை வரையறுக்கும் பயனர் இடைமுகம் மற்று கதை சென்ட்டரின் இலக்கு என்னவென்றால் ஒரு சுலபமான ஆனால் சக்தியுடைய இடைமுகம் கற்றுக்கொள்ள சில படைப்பான எழுத்தாளர்களை வெளிப்படுத்துவதற்காக இருக் இத்தகைய கருவிகளின் பல உதாரணங்களை நாம் உருவாக்குகிறோம், செயல்பாட்டில் எல்லைகள் மற்றும் பிரச்சனைகளை சுற்றி இருக', 'ur': 'بہت بڑی زبان مدل کے ساتھ بہت کم شٹ کی تعلیم کا اختیار ہے کہ شخصوں کو فرمول ماشین کی تعلیم کے بغیر کسی شخص کو ٹیکسٹ مدل تک پہنچ سکے۔ ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ یہ کس طرح کارساز لکھانے والوں کے لئے لائق ہوتا ہے اور کہانی سنتور کے ذریعہ پیش کرتا ہے، تھوڑے شیٹ موڈل کی پروٹاتیپٹ کرنے کے لئے ایک کارساز انٹرنیفٹ اور ایک مجموعہ دوبارہ پیدا کرنے والی ویب komponenتوں کے ساتھ سنتور کا مقصد یہ ہے کہ خلاقی لکھنے والوں کو ایک سادہ لیکن طاقتور انٹرنیفس کے ساتھ سیکھنے کے لئے ظاہر کرنا ہے جو ان کو اپنے ساتھ سازمانی ابزار بنانے کے لئے اجازت دیتا ہے جو اپنی مختلف طریقوں کو اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ ہم ایسے ابزار کے چند مثالیں بناتے ہیں، اور اس پروسس میں حدود اور مسائل کو بڑی زبان مدل کے ساتھ محیط کر رہے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Katta tillar modellari bilan o'rganishni bir necha ko'p o'rganish mumkin, formal mashinalar o'rganish uchun matn modellariga juda ko'p kengaytirilgan matnni o'rganish imkoniyatini o'rganish mumkin. Biz bu ishni ijodkorlik yozuvchilar va hozir Story Centaur uchun foydalanuvchi interfeyslarini ko'rsatuvchimiz. Ko'pchilik shakllar modellari va ularni qaytadan qo'llab tashlab boʻladigan veb komponentlariga qanday qo'llanmaydi. Boshqa Centaur maqsadi ijodkorlik yozuvchilarni o'rganishga juda oddiy, lekin kuchli interfeys bilan o'rganishni ko'rsatish mumkin. Bu ularning o'z o'zimlarining uning uning xoh sanatik yordamlarini o'zgartirish imkoniyatini yaratishga ruxsat beradi. Biz bunday asboblarning bir necha misollarini yaramiz, va jarayonining chegaralari va muammolari yordamida katta tillar modellari bilan boshlanadi.", 'vi': 'Rất ít người học tập bắn với các mô hình ngôn ngữ lớn có khả năng cung cấp cho cá nhân mà không cần đào tạo máy móc chính thức, quyền truy cập vào một loạt các mô hình văn bản rộng. Chúng tôi xem xét việc này áp dụng cho các nhà văn sáng tạo và trình bày Story Centauri, một giao diện người dùng cho việc xử lý mẫu ảnh cung cấp mẫu ảnh và một tập hợp các thành phần mạng mới được bố trí. Chương trình Centauri là vạch trần các nhà văn s áng tạo cho một số người học tập bắn với một bản giao diện đơn giản nhưng mạnh để họ có thể tự sáng tạo các công cụ đồng tạo để phát triển hướng đạo nghệ độc đáo của mình. Chúng tôi tạo ra nhiều ví dụ về những công cụ này, và trong quá trình nghiên cứu ranh giới và các vấn đề bao quanh thế hệ với các mô hình ngôn ngữ lớn.', 'bg': 'Малко обучение с големи езикови модели има потенциала да даде на хората без официално обучение по машинно обучение достъп до широк спектър от текстови модели. Обмисляме как това се отнася за творческите писатели и представяме потребителски интерфейс за прототипиране на няколко модела и набор от рекомбинабилни уеб компоненти, които ги разгръщат. Целта на Кентавър е да изложи творческите писатели на няколко кадъра обучение с прост, но мощен интерфейс, който им позволява да съставят свои собствени инструменти за съвместно създаване, които допринасят за техните собствени уникални художествени направления. Изграждаме няколко примера за такива инструменти и в процеса изследваме границите и проблемите около поколението с големи езикови модели.', 'da': 'Få skudt læring med store sprogmodeller har potentialet til at give enkeltpersoner uden formel maskinlæring adgang til en bred vifte af tekst til tekst modeller. Vi overvejer, hvordan dette gælder for kreative forfattere og præsenterer Story Centaur, en brugergrænseflade til prototype af få skudmodeller og et sæt rekombinerbare webkomponenter, der implementerer dem. Story Centaurs mål er at udsætte kreative forfattere for få skudt læring med en enkel, men kraftfuld grænseflade, der lader dem komponere deres egne co-creation værktøjer, der fremmer deres egne unikke kunstneriske retninger. Vi opbygger flere eksempler på sådanne værktøjer og undersøger i processen grænserne og problemstillingerne omkring generation med store sprogmodeller.', 'nl': "Weinig schot leren met grote taalmodellen heeft het potentieel om individuen zonder formele machine learning toegang te geven tot een breed scala aan tekst tot tekstmodellen. We bekijken hoe dit van toepassing is op creatieve schrijvers en presenteren Story Centaur, een gebruikersinterface voor het prototypen van enkele shotmodellen en een set recombinabele webcomponenten die deze implementeren. Story Centaur's doel is om creatieve schrijvers bloot te stellen aan weinig schot learning met een eenvoudige maar krachtige interface waarmee ze hun eigen co-creatie tools kunnen samenstellen die hun eigen unieke artistieke richtingen bevorderen. We bouwen verschillende voorbeelden van dergelijke tools op en onderzoeken daarbij de grenzen en vraagstukken rondom generatie met grote taalmodellen.", 'hr': 'Malo stručnog učenja s velikim jezičkim modelima ima potencijal dati pojedincima bez formalnog učenja strojeva pristup širom raspona teksta tekstskim modelima. Razmišljamo o tome kako se to odnosi na kreativne pisce i predstavlja Story Centaur, korisnički interfejs za prototipiranje nekoliko modela snimanja i setu rekombinabilnih mrežnih komponenata koje ih razvijaju. Cilj priče Centaur a je otkrivanje kreativnih pisaca nekoliko pucnjava učenja jednostavnim, ali moćnim interfejsom koji im omogućava da sastave sopstvene alate za saradnju koji dalje svoja jedinstvena umjetnička smjera. Izgradili smo nekoliko primjera takvih alata, i u procesu istražujemo granice i probleme oko generacije sa velikim jezičkim modelima.', 'id': 'Beberapa tembakan belajar dengan model bahasa besar memiliki potensi untuk memberikan individu tanpa mesin formal belajar pelatihan akses ke jangkauan besar teks ke model teks. Kami mempertimbangkan bagaimana ini berlaku untuk penulis kreatif dan hadir Story Centaur, antarmuka pengguna untuk prototip beberapa model tembakan dan set komponen web rekombinan yang menggunakan mereka. Tujuan Story Centaur adalah untuk mengekspos penulis kreatif kepada beberapa penembak belajar dengan antaramuka sederhana tetapi kuat yang memungkinkan mereka membuat alat ciptaan mereka sendiri yang melanjutkan arah seni unik mereka sendiri. Kami membangun beberapa contoh dari alat-alat tersebut, dan dalam proses menyelidiki batas dan masalah sekitar generasi dengan model bahasa besar.', 'fa': 'کمی از یادگیری با مدل های زبان بزرگ توانایی دارد که افراد را بدون یادگیری ماشین رسمی به دسترسی دسترسی به مدل های متن وسیع به مدل متن بدهند. ما فکر می\u200cکنیم این چگونه برای نویسندگان خلاقی و سنتاور داستان را پیشنهاد می\u200cکند، یک مشترک کاربر برای پیش\u200cنویسی چند مدل شلیک و مجموعه\u200cای از بخش\u200cهای وب باز\u200cسازی که آنها را استفاده می\u200cکنند. هدف داستان سنتاور اینه که نویسندگان خلاقی را به تعلیم چند تا از یادگیری های آسان ولی قدرتمندی که به آنها اجازه می دهد ابزارهای همکاری خود را ترکیب کنند که مسیرهای هنری ویژه خود را بیشتر می دهند. ما چندتا مثال از این ابزار ساختیم، و در فرایند مرزها و مسائل محیط نسل را با مدل های زبان بزرگ تحقیق کنیم.', 'ko': '대형 언어 모델의 소량의 스냅샷 학습을 사용하면 정식 기계 학습 교육을 받지 않은 개인이 광범위한 텍스트를 텍스트 모델로 얻을 수 있다.창의적인 작가와 현재 이야기인 Centaur에 어떻게 적용할 것인가를 고려합니다. Centaur는 소수의 렌즈 모델을 원형화하는 사용자 인터페이스와 이를 배치할 수 있는 재구성 가능한 웹 구성 요소입니다.Story Centaur의 목표는 간단하지만 강력한 인터페이스를 통해 창의적인 작가들이 소량의 렌즈 학습을 접할 수 있도록 하고 그들이 자신의 공동 창작 도구를 창작하여 자신의 독특한 예술 방향을 더욱 추진하는 것이다.우리는 이러한 도구의 예시를 구축했고 이 과정에서 대형 언어 모델이 생성하는 경계와 문제점을 탐색했다.', 'tr': "Uly dil nusgalary bilen az öwrenmek üçin formal maşyny öwrenmeden adamlara metin nusgalaryna ýerleşmegi mümkinçiligi bar. Biz bu şekilde yaratıcı yazarlar we şu and a Hizrah Centaur'a nähili uygulandygyny düşünýäris, birnäçe resim nusgalaryny prototyp etmek üçin ullançylar we ýene-täk üýtgeýän web komponentleri üçin ullanýarys. Centaur'un hedefi, yaratıcı yazarları birkaç atly öwrenmeleri birkaç basit fakat güçlü bir arayüz ile ortaya koymak. Bu olara özlerinin birleştirme araçlarını özlerinin beýleki sungat yönlerini geliştirmek üçin yaratmak. Böyle guramlaryň birnäçe mysal çykardyk we bu prosesde döwletleri uly dil nusgalary bilen çykardyk.", 'sq': "Mësimi i pak gjuhëve me modele të mëdha ka potencialin për t'u dhënë individëve pa mësimin zyrtar të makinave aksesin në një gamë të gjerë teksti në modele teksti. Ne konsiderojmë se si kjo aplikohet për shkrimtarët kreativë dhe prezantojmë Story Centaur, një interfaqe përdoruesi për prototipin e disa modeleve fotografike dhe një sërë komponentesh rekombinante të internetit që i vendosin a to. Story Centaur's goal is to expose creative writers to few shot learning with a simple but powerful interface that lets them compose their own co-creation tools that further their own unique artistic directions.  Ne krijojmë disa shembuj të mjeteve të tilla dhe në proces hetojmë kufijtë dhe çështjet rreth gjeneratës me modele të mëdha gjuhësh.", 'sw': 'Picha chache za kujifunza kwa mifano makubwa ya lugha ina uwezekano wa kuwapa watu bila mashine rasmi ya kujifunza mafunzo ya upatikanaji wa ujumbe wa maandishi kwa mifano ya maandishi. Tunafikiri namna hii inavyotumika kwa waandishi wenye ubunifu na sasa Story Centaur, mtazamo wa mtumiaji wa kutengeneza mifano michache ya risasi na baadhi ya vipengele vya mtandaoni vinavyotumia. Lengo la Story Centaur ni kuwaonyesha waandishi wenye ubunifu wa kujifunza kwa kutumia picha nyepesi lakini yenye nguvu inayoruhusu kujenga vifaa vyao vya kuunda pamoja ambavyo vinaendelea njia zao za sanaa za kipekee. Tunaweza kutengeneza mifano kadhaa ya zana hizo, na katika mchakato unaonyesha mipaka na masuala yanayozunguka kizazi chenye mifano makubwa ya lugha.', 'am': 'በታላቅ ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች የተማሩ ጥቂቶች ፎቶዎች የጽሑፍ ዓይነቶች ለመግኘት የጽሑፍ ዓይነቶች ለማግኘት ስልጣን ያላቸው ናቸው፡፡ ይህ ጥያቄ ጸሐፊዎች እና ታሪክ ስንትሮር፣ የኢንተርኔት የኢንተርኔት ኢንተርኔር፣ ለጥቂት የፎቶት ምሳሌዎች እና የበለጠ የበይነመረብ ክፍተቶችን እንዴት እንደሚገልጽ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ታሪክ ስናታር የፍጥረት ጸሐፊዎች በጥቂት ነገር ግን በኃይለኛ interface የተማሩትን እና የራሳቸውን የተለየ የብሔራዊ የስልጣናት ጥናት ማቀናጃ እንዲያሳስቡ ነው፡፡ እንደነዚህ መሣሪያዎች ብዙዎችን ምሳሌዎች እንሠራለን፣ በክፍለ ዘመናውም የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች በዙሪያው ያሉትን ዳርቻና ጉዳዮች እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'af': "Baie skoot leer met groot taal modele het die potensieal om individuele te gee sonder formeel masjien leer die toegang tot 'n wyde reek teks tot teks modele te leer. Ons beskou hoe hierdie toepassing is vir kreatiewe skrywers en voorsien storie Centaur, 'n gebruikerkoppelvlak vir prototipering paar skoot modelles en 'n stel van rekombinaabele web komponente wat hulle verwyder. Gestorie Centaur se doel is om kreatiewe skrywers te eksponer na paar skoot te leer met 'n eenvoudige maar kragtige koppelvlak wat laat hulle hul eie kopskep nutsprogramme te stel wat verder hul eie unieke kunstiese rigtings. Ons bou verskeie voorbeelde van sodanige nutsprogramme uit, en in die proses probeer die grense en probleme omring die generasie met groot taal modele.", 'bn': 'বিশাল ভাষার মডেল দিয়ে শিক্ষা শিখতে কয়েকটি গুলি আছে ব্যক্তিকে আনুষ্ঠানিক মেশিন ছাড়া প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করতে পারে যে টেক্সট মড We consider how this applies to creative writers and present Story Centaur, a user interface for prototyping few shot models and a set of recombinable web components that deploy them.  স্টোরি সেন্টুরের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে সৃষ্টিশীল লেখকদের একটি সাধারণ কিন্তু শক্তিশালী ইন্টারফেস দিয়ে শিক্ষা প্রকাশ করার জন্য, যা তাদের নিজেদের সৃ আমরা এই ধরনের টুলসের বেশ কয়েকটি উদাহরণ তৈরি করি এবং এই প্রক্রিয়ায় বিশাল ভাষার মডেল দিয়ে সীমানা এবং প্রজন্মের চারপাশে', 'hy': 'Մեծ լեզվի մոդելների օգնությամբ մի քիչ լուսանկարներ սովորելը ունի պոտենցիալ, որպեսզի անհատներին, առանց ֆորմալ մեքենային սովորելու, հնարավորություն տա տեքստի մոդելների հնարավորություն Մենք հաշվի առնում ենք, թե ինչպես է սա տեղի ունենում ստեղծագործական գրողների և ներկայիս Պատմություն Սենթաուրի համար, օգտագործողի ինտերֆեյսը մի քանի նկարահանման մոդելների նախատիպ ստեղծելու համար և մի շարք ռեկոբինանսավոր վեբ- Պատմություն Սենթայուրի նպատակն է բացահայտել ստեղծագործական գրողներին մի քանի նկարների սովորելու համար պարզ, բայց հզոր ինտերֆեյսով, որը թույլ է տալիս նրանց կազմել իրենց սեփական գործիքները, որոնք զարգանում են իրենց սեփական արվեստական ուղղությունները: Մենք ստեղծում ենք նման գործիքների մի քանի օրինակ, և այդ ընթացքում ուսումնասիրում ենք սերունդը շրջապատող սահմանները և խնդիրները մեծ լեզվի մոդելներով:', 'az': "Büyük dil modelləri ilə öyrənmək çox çətinliklərdən fərqli maşın öyrənməsi olmadan şəxslərə mətn modellərinə əlaqəsini təhsil etməyə mümkün olar. Biz bu yaratıcı yazıcılara və Story Centaur a'ya necə uyğun olduğunu düşünürük, bir neçə foto modellərini prototyp etmək üçün istifadəçi interfejsi və onları yayınlayan yenidən birləşdirə bilən web komponentlərini. Centaur hekayəsinin məqsədi, yaratıcı yazıcıları bir az çox asanlıq, güclü bir interfejlə öyrənmək idi ki, onlar özlərinin birlikdə yaratma vasitələrini yaratmaq və özlərinin ünsiyyətli sanatçı yönlərini daha da artırmaq istəyirlər. Biz böyük vasitələrin bir neçə məsəl in şa edirik, və prosesdə nəsilləri böyük dil modelləri ilə ətrafındakı sınırları və məsələləri incidirik.", 'bs': 'Malo stručnog učenja sa velikim jezičkim modelima ima potencijal dati pojedincima bez formalnog učenja mašine pristup širom raspona teksta do tekstskih modela. Razmišljamo o tome kako se to odnosi na kreativne pisce i predstavlja Centaur priče, korisnički interfejs za prototipiranje nekoliko modela snimanja i setu rekombinibilnih internetskih komponenata koje ih razvijaju. Cilj priče Centaur a je otkrivanje kreativnih pisaca nekoliko pucnjava na učenje jednostavnom, ali moćnom interfejsu koji im omogućava da sastave sopstvene alate za saradnju koji dodaju svoja jedinstvena umjetnička uputa. Izgradili smo nekoliko primjera takvih alata, i u procesu istražujemo granice i probleme oko generacije sa velikim jezičkim modelima.', 'ca': "Poc aprenentatge amb grans models de llenguatge té el potencial de donar a individus sense aprenentatge formal màquina l'accés a una gran varietat de text a models de text. Considerem com això s'aplica als escriptors creativs i presentem Story Centaur, una interfície d'usuari per prototipar pocs models fotografiats i un conjunt de components web recombinables que els desplieguen. L'objectiu del Story Centaur és exposar escriptors creativs a pocs films d'aprenentatge amb una interfície simple però poderosa que els permet composir les seves pròpies eines de co-creació que promouen les seves pròpies direccions artístices únices. We build out several examples of such tools, and in the process probe the boundaries and issues surrounding generation with large language models.", 'cs': 'Málo učení s velkými jazykovými modely má potenciál poskytnout jednotlivcům bez formálního školení strojového učení přístup k široké škále textových modelů. Zvažujeme, jak se to týká kreativních autorů a představujeme Story Centaur, uživatelské rozhraní pro prototypování několika fotomodelů a sadu rekombinovatelných webových komponent, které je nasazují. Cílem příběhu Centaur je vystavit tvůrčím spisovatelům několik záběrů učení s jednoduchým, ale výkonným rozhraním, které jim umožní vytvářet vlastní nástroje pro spolutvorbu, které podporují jejich vlastní jedinečné umělecké směry. Sestavíme několik příkladů takových nástrojů a v procesu zkoumáme hranice a problémy kolem generování velkými jazykovými modely.', 'et': 'Vähesed suurte keelemudelitega õppimisel on potentsiaal anda ametliku masinõppe väljaõppeta inimestele juurdepääs mitmesugustele tekstimudelitele. Me kaalume, kuidas see kehtib loomingulistele kirjanikele ja esitame Story Centauri, kasutajaliidese prototüüpimiseks mõned pildimudelid ja komplekti rekombineeritavad veebikomponendid, mis neid juurutavad. Lugu Centauri eesmärk on avada loomingulised kirjanikud vähesele pildistamisele lihtsa, kuid võimsa liidesega, mis võimaldab neil koostada oma kaasloomise tööriistad, mis edendavad nende ainulaadseid kunstilisi suundi. Töötame välja mitmeid näiteid sellistest tööriistadest ning uurime protsessis põlvkonna piire ja probleeme suurte keelemudelitega.', 'fi': 'Harva mahdollisuus oppia suurilla kielimalleilla antaa henkilöille, joilla ei ole virallista koneoppimiskoulutusta, mahdollisuus käyttää monenlaisia tekstimalleja. Tarkastelemme, miten tämä pätee luoviin kirjoittajiin ja esittelemme Story Centaurin, käyttöliittymän muutaman shot-mallin prototyyppiin ja joukon rekombinatiivisia web-komponentteja, jotka ottavat ne käyttöön. Story Centaurin tavoitteena on altistaa luovat kirjoittajat muutamalle shot-oppimiselle yksinkertaisella mutta tehokkaalla käyttöliittymällä, jonka avulla he voivat luoda omia yhteiskehittämisen työkaluja, jotka edistävät omia ainutlaatuisia taiteellisia suuntia. Kehitämme useita esimerkkejä tällaisista työkaluista ja tutkimme prosessissa sukupolvien rajoja ja ongelmia suurilla kielimalleilla.', 'de': 'Nur wenige Shot Learning mit großen Sprachmodellen hat das Potenzial, Einzelpersonen ohne formales maschinelles Lernen Zugang zu einer breiten Palette von Text-zu-Text-Modellen zu geben. Wir betrachten, wie dies auf kreative Autoren zutrifft und präsentieren Story Centaur, eine Benutzeroberfläche zum Prototypen von wenigen Shot-Modellen und einer Reihe rekombinanter Webkomponenten, die sie bereitstellen. Story Centaurs Ziel ist es, kreative Autoren mit einer einfachen, aber leistungsstarken Benutzeroberfläche dem Lernen von wenigen Szenen auszustatten, mit der sie ihre eigenen Co-Creation-Tools zusammenstellen können, die ihre eigenen einzigartigen künstlerischen Richtungen vorantreiben. Wir bauen mehrere Beispiele solcher Werkzeuge auf und erforschen dabei die Grenzen und Fragestellungen der Generierung mit großen Sprachmodellen.', 'ha': "Kaɗan shot da ake karanta masu motsi mai girma cikin harshen, yana da ikon ya iya bai wa mutane ba idan an sanar da kwamfyutan kimar rasmi ba, kuma yana da amfani da matsayi mai yawa zuwa misali na rubutu. Kana ƙayyade yadda wannan ke amfani da wasu marubuci na rubutu da yanzu, History Centaur, mai haɗi na amfani da wa misalin misãlai kaɗan da sami masu samu'in da za'a lissafa su. Haƙin Kiƙin Centaur ne dõmin ya buɗe marubuci masu iya halitta da kwamfyuta, su sami karatun masu iya amfani da kwamfyuta mai sauƙi, kuma amma mai ƙarfi da kwamfyuta don su sami zance-saman da su samu'in da ke ƙara shiryoyin su masu da ke da fili. Munã samun misãlai masu yinin wannan zanen aiki, kuma a cikin aikin za'a sami grensa da masu matsayi da ke kẽwayẽwar zayen da misãlai masu girma.", 'sk': 'Malo poskusnega učenja z velikimi jezikovnimi modeli lahko posameznikom brez formalnega strojnega učenja omogoči dostop do širokega nabora besedilnih modelov do besedilnih modelov. Preučimo, kako to velja za ustvarjalne pisce in predstavljamo Story Centaur, uporabniški vmesnik za prototipiranje nekaj modelov posnetkov in nabor rekombinantnih spletnih komponent, ki jih uvajajo. Cilj Centaurja je izpostaviti ustvarjalne pisatelje nekaj posnetkov učenja s preprostim, a zmogljivim vmesnikom, ki jim omogoča sestavljanje lastnih orodij soustvarjanja, ki podpirajo njihove edinstvene umetniške smeri. Izdelujemo več primerov takšnih orodij, v procesu pa s pomočjo velikih jezikovnih modelov preučujemo meje in vprašanja generacije.', 'jv': 'Genjer-Genjer paling nggambar sistem kbar ing model sing luwih dumadhi, iso nggawe perbudhakan bakal terus bantuan sistem formal kuwi nggawe akses ditulak sampek bantuan teks kanggo model teks. Awak dhéwé isih ngubah iki ngono nggawe barang nggambar oleh banter sing kreatif lan nganggo Daftar Centur, pengaturan pengguna nggo prototipin model sing dadi nyong, lan padha sistem sing kompon sing paling-kompon sing paling nggawe ngubah dhéwé. Tarjamahan centearep kuwi nglanggar oleh bantuan kreatif kanggo nguasai kapan mulalah sing sampeyan nguasai kapan mulalah sing nguasai perbudhakan kanggo nguasai alat sing sampeyan sampeyan nguasai perusahaan sing liwih dumadhi sing artistik yo sampeyan. Awak dhéwé nggawe akeh pisan sing sampeyan kanggo ngelambang alat, lan ning angka sing beraksi gerakan kanggo kalaha luwih dumadhan karo model sing luwih bantuan.', 'he': 'למידה קטנה עם דוגמני שפה גדולים יש את הפוטנציאל לתת לאנשים ללא לימוד מכונות רשמי גישה לטווח רחב של טקסט לדוגמנים טקסטים. אנחנו שוקלים איך זה מתייחס לכותבים יצירתיים ומציג סיפור סנטאור, ממשק משתמש עבור אבטיפוס כמה דוגמנים צילומים וסט של רכיבי רשת משולבים שמפעילים אותם. המטרה של סינטאור הסיפור היא לחשוף סופרים יצירתיים למידה קטנה עם ממשק פשוט אבל חזק שמאפשר להם לרכב כלי יצירת משלהם שממשיך לכיוונים האמנתיים הייחודיים שלהם. אנו בונים כמה דוגמאות של כלים כאלה, ובהתהליך חוקרים את הגבולות והבעיות שמקפיצות דור עם דוגמני שפה גדולים.', 'bo': "སྐད་ཡིག་མ་དབྱིབས་ཆེ་བ་དང་བསྟུན་ནས་དབྱེ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་ལས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་མ་ལག་གི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པའི་མི་སྟོན་ We consider how this applies to creative writers and present Story Centaur, a user interface for prototyping few shot models and a set of recombinable web components that deploy them. Story Centaur's goal is to expose creative writers to few shot learning with a simple but powerful interface that lets them compose their own co-creation tools that further their own unique artistic directions. ང་ཚོས་འདི་དག་གི་དཔེ་བརྗོད་དག་ཆ་ཤས་གཅིག་ལས་སྦྱོར་ནང་གི་མཐའ་དབུགས་ཆ་དང་མཐའ་དབུགས་ཀྱི་མི་སྐྱེས་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་བློ་"}
{'en': 'OCTIS : Comparing and Optimizing Topic models is Simple !', 'pt': 'OCTIS: Comparar e otimizar modelos de tópicos é simples!', 'es': 'OCTIS: ¡Comparar y optimizar los modelos Topic es simple!', 'ar': 'OCTIS: مقارنة نماذج الموضوعات وتحسينها أمر بسيط!', 'fr': "OCTIS\xa0: Comparer et optimiser des modèles thématiques, c'est simple\xa0!", 'ja': 'OCTIS ：トピックモデルの比較と最適化は簡単です！', 'zh': 'OCTIS:较优化太简!', 'hi': 'OCTIS: तुलना और विषय मॉडल अनुकूलन सरल है!', 'ru': 'OCTIS: Сравнение и оптимизация тематических моделей - это просто!', 'ga': 'OCTIS: Is Simplí Samhlacha Topaic a Chur i gComparáid agus a bharrfheabhsú!', 'ka': 'OCTIS: შემდგომარება და ოპტიმიზაცია თემიკური მოდელები უკეთესია!', 'hu': 'OCTIS: A téma modellek összehasonlítása és optimalizálása egyszerű!', 'el': 'Η σύγκριση και βελτιστοποίηση των μοντέλων θεμάτων είναι απλή!', 'it': 'OCTIS: Confrontare e ottimizzare i modelli degli argomenti è semplice!', 'kk': 'OCTIS: Нақыштар үлгілерін салыстыру және оптимизациялау қарапайым!', 'ms': 'OCTIS: Comparing and Optimizing Topic models is Simple!', 'ml': 'ഒക്സിറ്റിസ്: ടോപ്പിക്ക് മോഡലുകള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നത് എളുപ്പമാണ്!', 'mn': 'ОКТИС: Сүүлийн загваруудыг харьцуулах болон сайжруулах загвар бол энгийн!', 'mt': 'OCTIS: Il-paragun u l-ottimizzazzjoni tal-mudelli tematiċi huma sempliċi!', 'lt': 'OCTIS: Comparing and Optimizing Topic models is Simple!', 'mk': 'Споредувањето и оптимизацијата на моделите на темата е едноставно!', 'no': 'OCTIS: Samanlikning og optimalisering av emnemodular er enkelt!', 'pl': 'OCTIS: Porównywanie i optymalizacja modeli tematów jest proste!', 'ro': 'OCTIS: Compararea și optimizarea modelelor subiectelor este simplă!', 'sr': 'Uspoređenje i optimizacije modela teme je jednostavno!', 'so': 'OCTIS: Isbardhigidda iyo optimizing models madamka waa fudud!', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න විද්\u200dයාව සම්පූර්ණය සහ හැකිරීම සරලයි!', 'ta': 'OCTIS: பொருள் மாதிரிகளை ஒப்பிடுதல் மற்றும் ஒப்பிடுதல் எளிதாகும்!', 'sv': 'OCTIS: Att jämföra och optimera ämnesmodeller är enkelt!', 'ur': 'OCTIS: ٹوپیک موڈل مقایسہ اور optimization ساده ہے!', 'uz': 'OCTIS: Mavzu modellarini moslash va moslash oddiy!', 'vi': 'OCRTIS: So sánh và tối ưu các mẫu Topic là Đơn giản!', 'bg': 'Сравняването и оптимизирането на тематичните модели е просто!', 'da': 'OCTIS: Sammenligning og optimering af emnemodeller er enkelt!', 'hr': 'Uspoređenje i optimiziranje modela teme je jednostavno!', 'nl': 'OCTIS: Het vergelijken en optimaliseren van topic modellen is eenvoudig!', 'de': 'OCTIS: Themenmodelle vergleichen und optimieren ist einfach!', 'ko': 'OCTIS: 주제 모델을 비교하고 최적화하는 것은 간단합니다!', 'fa': 'مقایسه و بهترین مدل موضوع ساده است!', 'id': 'Comparing and Optimizing Topic models is Simple!', 'sw': 'OCTIS: Comparing and Optimizing Topic models is Simple!', 'tr': 'OCTIS: Mazmunlar karşılaştyrma we iyileştirme nusgalar Basit!', 'af': 'OKSTIS: Vergelyking en Optimaliseering onderwerp modele is eenvoudig!', 'sq': 'Krahasimi dhe optimizimi i modeleve të temës është i thjeshtë!', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Օկտիս՝ Համեմատությունը և լավագույնը թեմային մոդելների հետ պարզ է:', 'az': 'OCTIS: Mevzu modell…ôrini qarŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrma v…ô optimizl…ôndirm…ôk asandńĪr!', 'bn': 'অক্টিটিস: বিষয়ের মডেল তুলনা এবং অপটিমিশন করা সহজ!', 'bs': 'Uspoređenje i optimiziranje modela teme je jednostavno!', 'ca': 'OCTIS: Comparar i optimitzar models de tema és simple!', 'cs': 'OCTIS: Porovnávání a optimalizace tématických modelů je jednoduché!', 'et': 'OCTIS: Teema mudelite võrdlemine ja optimeerimine on lihtne!', 'fi': 'OCTIS: Aihemallien vertailu ja optimointi on yksinkertaista!', 'jv': 'Optimisate', 'ha': 'OATIS: Yi daidaita da Yin Amfanin Madaidaici na Gamma!', 'he': 'השוואה והאופטימיזציה של מודלים נושאיים היא פשוט!', 'sk': 'OCTIS: Primerjava in optimizacija tematskih modelov je preprosta!', 'bo': 'OCTIS: མཉམ་བསྡུས་བྱེད་དང་དུས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་རིས་མིན་འདུག'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we present OCTIS, a framework for training, analyzing, and comparing Topic Models, whose optimal hyper-parameters are estimated using a Bayesian Optimization approach. The proposed solution integrates several state-of-the-art topic models and evaluation metrics. These metrics can be targeted as objective by the underlying optimization procedure to determine the best hyper-parameter configuration. OCTIS allows researchers and practitioners to have a fair comparison between topic models of interest, using several benchmark datasets and well-known evaluation metrics, to integrate novel algorithms, and to have an interactive visualization of the results for understanding the behavior of each model. The code is available at the following link : https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقدم OCTIS ، إطار عمل للتدريب والتحليل والمقارنة بين نماذج الموضوعات ، والتي يتم تقدير معلماتها الفائقة المثلى باستخدام نهج Bayesian Optimization. يدمج الحل المقترح العديد من نماذج الموضوعات الحديثة ومقاييس التقييم. يمكن استهداف هذه المقاييس كهدف من خلال إجراء التحسين الأساسي لتحديد أفضل تكوين للمعلمة الفائقة. يسمح OCTIS للباحثين والممارسين بإجراء مقارنة عادلة بين نماذج الموضوعات ذات الأهمية ، باستخدام العديد من مجموعات البيانات المعيارية ومقاييس التقييم المعروفة ، لدمج خوارزميات جديدة ، والحصول على تصور تفاعلي للنتائج لفهم سلوك كل نموذج. الرمز متاح على الرابط التالي: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons OCTIS, un cadre de formation, d'analyse et de comparaison de modèles thématiques, dont les hyperparamètres optimaux sont estimés à l'aide d'une approche d'optimisation bayésienne. La solution proposée intègre plusieurs modèles thématiques et métriques d'évaluation de pointe. Ces mesures peuvent être ciblées en tant qu'objectifs par la procédure d'optimisation sous-jacente afin de déterminer la meilleure configuration d'hyperparamètres. OCTIS permet aux chercheurs et aux praticiens d'avoir une comparaison équitable entre les modèles thématiques d'intérêt, en utilisant plusieurs ensembles de données de référence et des mesures d'évaluation bien connues, d'intégrer de nouveaux algorithmes et d'avoir une visualisation interactive des résultats pour comprendre le comportement de chaque modèle. Le code est disponible sur le lien suivant\xa0: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos o OCTIS, um framework para treinamento, análise e comparação de Topic Models, cujos hiperparâmetros ótimos são estimados usando uma abordagem de Otimização Bayesiana. A solução proposta integra vários modelos de tópicos e métricas de avaliação de última geração. Essas métricas podem ser direcionadas como objetivas pelo procedimento de otimização subjacente para determinar a melhor configuração de hiperparâmetro. O OCTIS permite que pesquisadores e profissionais tenham uma comparação justa entre modelos de tópicos de interesse, usando vários conjuntos de dados de referência e métricas de avaliação conhecidas, para integrar novos algoritmos e ter uma visualização interativa dos resultados para entender o comportamento de cada modelo. O código está disponível no seguinte link: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos OCTIS, un marco para entrenar, analizar y comparar modelos de temas, cuyos hiperparámetros óptimos se estiman mediante un enfoque de optimización bayesiana. La solución propuesta integra varios modelos de temas y métricas de evaluación de última generación. El procedimiento de optimización subyacente puede apuntar a estas métricas como objetivo para determinar la mejor configuración de hiperparámetros. OCTIS permite a los investigadores y profesionales realizar una comparación justa entre los modelos temáticos de interés, utilizando varios conjuntos de datos de referencia y métricas de evaluación bien conocidas, para integrar algoritmos novedosos y tener una visualización interactiva de los resultados para comprender el comportamiento de cada modelo. El código está disponible en el siguiente enlace: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'zh': '本文引OCTIS,此一以训练,析校模框架,其最佳者参数用贝叶斯优化度之。 所建解决方案集成数最先进主题模形及评估指标。 此指标可以基优化为的,以定超参数配。 OCTIS许论人数集和众所周知指标,平较兴趣,以集新算,交互式可视化而知之。 以下链接供代码:https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS。', 'ja': '本稿では、最適なハイパーパラメータがベイズ最適化アプローチを用いて推定されるトピックモデルをトレーニング、分析、比較するためのフレームワークであるOCTISを提示する。提案されたソリューションは、いくつかの最先端のトピックモデルと評価指標を統合しています。これらのメトリックは、基礎となる最適化手順によって客観的にターゲットを絞り、最適なハイパーパラメータ構成を決定することができます。OCTISを使用すると、研究者と実践者は、いくつかのベンチマークデータセットと既知の評価指標を使用して、関心のあるトピックモデル間で公正な比較を行い、新規のアルゴリズムを統合し、各モデルの挙動を理解するための結果のインタラクティブな視覚化を行うことができます。コードは次のリンクから入手できます。https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम OCTIS, प्रशिक्षण, विश्लेषण और विषय मॉडल की तुलना के लिए एक रूपरेखा प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जिनके इष्टतम हाइपर-पैरामीटर का अनुमान बायेसियन ऑप्टिमाइज़ेशन दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग करके लगाया जाता है। प्रस्तावित समाधान कई अत्याधुनिक विषय मॉडल और मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक को एकीकृत करता है। इन मैट्रिक्स को सर्वोत्तम हाइपर-पैरामीटर कॉन्फ़िगरेशन निर्धारित करने के लिए अंतर्निहित ऑप्टिमाइज़ेशन प्रक्रिया द्वारा उद्देश्य के रूप में लक्षित किया जा सकता है। OCTIS शोधकर्ताओं और चिकित्सकों को रुचि के विषय मॉडल के बीच एक उचित तुलना करने की अनुमति देता है, कई बेंचमार्क डेटासेट और प्रसिद्ध मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक का उपयोग करके, उपन्यास एल्गोरिदम को एकीकृत करने के लिए, और प्रत्येक मॉडल के व्यवहार को समझने के लिए परिणामों का एक इंटरैक्टिव विज़ुअलाइज़ेशन रखने के लिए। कोड निम्न लिंक पर उपलब्ध है: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем OCTIS, структуру для обучения, анализа и сравнения тематических моделей, оптимальные гиперпараметры которых оцениваются с использованием подхода байесовской оптимизации. Предлагаемое решение объединяет несколько современных тематических моделей и оценочных показателей. Эти метрики могут быть нацелены как объективные с помощью базовой процедуры оптимизации для определения наилучшей конфигурации гиперпараметров. OCTIS позволяет исследователям и практикам иметь справедливое сравнение между тематическими моделями, представляющими интерес, используя несколько эталонных наборов данных и хорошо известные оценочные метрики, интегрировать новые алгоритмы и иметь интерактивную визуализацию результатов для понимания поведения каждой модели. Код доступен по ссылке: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid OCTIS i láthair, creat le haghaidh oiliúna, anailíse, agus comparáide Múnlaí Topaicí, a meastar a hipirpharaiméadair optamach ag baint úsáide as cur chuige Optamaithe Bayesian. Comhtháthaíonn an réiteach atá beartaithe roinnt samhlacha topaice agus méadracht mheastóireachta úrscothach. Is féidir díriú ar na méadrachtaí seo mar aidhm oibiachtúil ag an nós imeachta leas iomlán a bhaint bunúsach chun an chumraíocht hipearpharaiméadair is fearr a chinneadh. Ligeann OCTIS do thaighdeoirí agus do chleachtóirí comparáid chothrom a bheith acu idir samhlacha topaicí spéise, ag baint úsáide as roinnt tacar sonraí tagarmharcála agus méadracht mheastóireachta a bhfuil clú orthu, chun algartaim nua a chomhtháthú, agus léirshamhlú idirghníomhach a bheith acu ar na torthaí chun iompar gach samhla a thuiscint. Tá an cód ar fáil ag an nasc seo a leanas: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε ένα πλαίσιο εκπαίδευσης, ανάλυσης και σύγκρισης Θεματικών Μοντέλων, των οποίων οι βέλτιστες υπερ-παράμετροι υπολογίζονται χρησιμοποιώντας μια προσέγγιση Μπειζιανής Βελτιστοποίησης. Η προτεινόμενη λύση ενσωματώνει αρκετά σύγχρονα μοντέλα θεμάτων και μετρήσεις αξιολόγησης. Αυτές οι μετρήσεις μπορούν να στοχοποιηθούν ως αντικειμενικές από την υποκείμενη διαδικασία βελτιστοποίησης για να καθοριστεί η καλύτερη διαμόρφωση υπερπαραμέτρων. Το επιτρέπει σε ερευνητές και επαγγελματίες να έχουν μια δίκαιη σύγκριση μεταξύ θεμάτων μοντέλων ενδιαφέροντος, χρησιμοποιώντας διάφορα σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς και γνωστές μετρήσεις αξιολόγησης, να ενσωματώσουν νέους αλγόριθμους και να έχουν μια διαδραστική απεικόνιση των αποτελεσμάτων για την κατανόηση της συμπεριφοράς κάθε μοντέλου. Ο κωδικός διατίθεται στον ακόλουθο σύνδεσμο: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk az OCTIS-t, amely egy olyan téma modellek képzésére, elemzésére és összehasonlítására szolgáló keretrendszert, amelynek optimális hiperparamétereit Bayesian Optimization megközelítéssel becsüljük meg. A javasolt megoldás több korszerű témamodellt és értékelési mutatót is integrál. Ezeket a mutatókat objektívként lehet célozni az alapul szolgáló optimalizálási eljárással, hogy meghatározza a legjobb hiperparaméter konfigurációt. Az OCTIS lehetővé teszi a kutatók és a szakemberek számára, hogy tisztességes összehasonlítást nyújtsanak az érdeklődésre számot tartó témaköri modellek között, több benchmark adathalmaz és jól ismert értékelési mutatók segítségével, hogy integrálják az új algoritmusokat, és interaktív vizualizációt biztosítsanak az eredményekről az egyes modellek viselkedésének megértéséhez. A kód az alábbi linken érhető el: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენში ჩვენ OCTIS-ს გამოყენებთ, რომელიც განსწავლის, ანალიზაციის და დამყენებელი ტემიკური მოდელების ფრამეტრი, რომელიც ოპტიმალური ჰიპერ-პარამეტრები გამოყენებულია,  პროგრამეტრებული პასუხის ინტერგურაცია რამდენიმე ხელსაწყისი ტემეტიკის მოდელები და განსაზღვრების მეტრიკები. ეს მეტრიკები შეიძლება მიყენება, როგორც მიყენებული ოპტიმიზაციის პროცემის მიხედვით, რომ განსაზღვრება უკეთესი ჰიპერ-პარამეტრის კონფიგურაცი OCTIS მოცემულებელი და პრაქტიკონტებელი უნდა იყოს საინტერესო მოდელების განმავლობას, რამდენიმე ბენქმეპური მონაცემები და უცნობიერი განმავლობის მეტრიკის გამოყენება, პრომენტის ალგორიტების ინტერგურაცია და შედეგის ინტერქ კოდის შესაძლებელია: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'it': "In questo articolo presentiamo OCTIS, un framework per la formazione, l'analisi e il confronto dei modelli topici, i cui iper-parametri ottimali sono stimati utilizzando un approccio Bayesian Optimization. La soluzione proposta integra diversi modelli tematici e metriche di valutazione all'avanguardia. Queste metriche possono essere mirate come obiettivo dalla procedura di ottimizzazione sottostante per determinare la migliore configurazione iper-parametro. OCTIS consente a ricercatori e professionisti di avere un confronto equo tra modelli tematici di interesse, utilizzando diversi set di dati benchmark e metriche di valutazione ben note, di integrare algoritmi innovativi e di avere una visualizzazione interattiva dei risultati per comprendere il comportamento di ogni modello. Il codice è disponibile al seguente link: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда OCTIS дегенді байезия оптимизациясының арқылы оптималдық гипер параметрлерін бақылап, оқыту, анализациялау және салыстыру үлгілерін көрсетеді. Келтірілген шешім бірнеше күй- жай нақыштар үлгілерін және бағалау метрикаларын біріктіреді. Бұл метрикалардың ең жақсы гипер параметрлерді баптау үшін негізгі оптимизациялау процедурының мақсатты болуы мүмкін. ОКТИС зерттеушілері мен практиктерлер тақырыптар үлгілері арасындағы бірнеше белгілі деректер қорларын және беймәлім бағалау метрикаларын қолдануға мүмкіндік береді, романдық алгоритмдерді біріктіру үшін және әрбір моделінің әрекетін түсіну Код келесі сілтемеде бар: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഓസിറ്റിസിനെ പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ ഫ്രെയിമെയില്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു, ടോപ്പിക് മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്ന തീരുമാനം കുറച്ച് സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ രീതിയില്\u200d നിന്നും കൂടുതല്\u200d വിവരങ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല ഹൈപ്പര്\u200d പാരാമീറ്റര്\u200d ക്രമീകരണം തീരുമാനിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള ഐക്യോമിഷന്\u200d പ്രക്രിയയാല്\u200d  ഒക്സിറ്റിഐസ് പരിശീലിക്കുന്നവരെയും പരിശീലിക്കുന്നവരെയും താല്പര്യമുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d നീതിപൂര്\u200dത്തീകരിക്കാന്\u200d അനുവദിക്കുന്നു, കുറച്ചു ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ് താഴെയുള്ള ലിങ്കില്\u200d കോഡ് ലഭ്യമല്ല: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw l-OCTIS, qafas għat-taħriġ, l-analiżi u t-tqabbil tal-Mudelli Topiċi, li l-a ħjar iperparatteri tagħhom huma stmati bl-użu ta’ approċċ Bayesian Optimization. Is-soluzzjoni proposta tintegra diversi mudelli ta’ suġġett l-aktar avvanzati u metriċi ta’ evalwazzjoni. Dawn il-metriċi jistgħu jiġu mmirati bħala objettivi mill-proċedura ta’ ottimizzazzjoni sottostanti biex tiġi ddeterminata l-aħjar konfigurazzjoni ta’ iperparaturi. OCTIS jippermetti lir-riċerkaturi u lill-prattikanti li jkollhom tqabbil ġust bejn mudelli tematiċi ta’ interess, bl-użu ta’ diversi settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ referenza u metriċi ta’ evalwazzjoni magħrufa sew, biex jintegraw algoritmi ġodda, u biex ikollhom viżwalizzazzjoni interattiva tar-riżultati għall-fehim tal-imġiba ta’ kull mudell. The code is available at the following link:  https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome OCTIS, mokymo, analizės ir teminių modelių palyginimo sistemą, kurios optimal ūs hiperparatoriai apskaičiuojami taikant Bayezijos optimizacijos metodą. Siūlomas sprendimas apima keletą naujausių teminių modelių ir vertinimo rodiklių. Šie rodikliai gali būti tikslingi taikant pagrindinę optimizacijos procedūrą, kad būtų galima nustatyti geriausią hiperparatorių konfigūraciją. OCTIS allows researchers and practitioners to have a fair comparison between topic models of interest, using several benchmark datasets and well-known evaluation metrics, to integrate novel algorithms, and to have an interactive visualization of the results for understanding the behavior of each model.  Kodas pateikiamas šioje nuorodoje: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид OCTIS-г суралцах, анализ болон харьцуулахын тулд суралцах хөрөнгө оруулж байна. Тэдгээрийн эерэг гипер-параметрыг Bayesian Optimization approach ашигладаг. Үүний санал өгсөн шийдэл нь олон урлагийн сэдвийн загвар болон үнэлгээний метрийг нэгтгэдэг. Эдгээр метрийг хамгийн сайн гипер-параметр загварыг тодорхойлж чадна. ОКТИС судлаачид болон мэргэжилтнүүд сэдвийн сонирхолтой загварын хоорондоо зөв харьцуулах боломж олгодог, олон салбарын өгөгдлийн сангуудыг ашиглаж, сайн мэддэг үнэлгээний метрик ашиглаж, шинэ алгоритмыг нэгтгэх боломж, загвар бүрийн үйл ажиллагааг ойлгох Энэ код дараагийн холбоотой байдаг: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, го претставуваме ОКТИС, рамка за обука, анализирање и споредба на темпичките модели, чии оптимални хиперпараметри се проценуваат користејќи бајезиски пристап на оптимизација. Предложеното решение интегрира неколку најсовремени темски модели и метрики за проценка. Овие метрики можат да бидат насочени како објективни со основната процедура на оптимизација за одредување на најдобрата конфигурација на хиперпараметрите. ОКТИС им овозможува на истражувачите и практиките да имаат фер споредба помеѓу темските модели на интерес, користејќи неколку набори на податоци за споредба и познати метрики за проценка, да интегрираат нови алгоритми и да имаат интерактивна визуелизација на резултатите за разбирање на однесувањето на секој модел Кодот е достапен на следната врска: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan OCTIS, kerangka untuk latihan, menganalisis, dan membandingkan Model Topik, yang hyperparameter optimal diharapkan menggunakan pendekatan Optimisasi Bayesian. Solusi yang diusulkan melibatkan beberapa model topik state-of-the-art dan metrik penilaian. Metrik ini boleh ditujukan sebagai objektif oleh prosedur optimasi yang didasarkan untuk menentukan konfigurasi hyper parameter terbaik. OCTIS membolehkan peneliti dan praktek mempunyai perbandingan yang adil antara model topik kepentingan, menggunakan beberapa set data benchmark dan metrik penilaian yang diketahui, untuk mengintegrasikan algoritma baru, dan untuk mempunyai visualisasi interaktif keputusan untuk memahami perilaku setiap model. Kod tersedia pada pautan berikut: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiamy OCTIS, framework do szkolenia, analizy i porównywania modeli tematycznych, których optymalne hiperparametry są oszacowane przy użyciu metody Bayesowskiej Optymalizacji. Proponowane rozwiązanie integruje kilka najnowocześniejszych modeli tematycznych i wskaźników oceny. Wskaźniki te mogą być ukierunkowane jako obiektywne przez podstawową procedurę optymalizacji w celu określenia najlepszej konfiguracji hiperparametrów. OCTIS umożliwia naukowcom i praktykom sprawiedliwe porównanie zainteresowanych modeli tematycznych, wykorzystując kilka zbiorów danych referencyjnych i dobrze znanych wskaźników oceny, integrację nowych algorytmów oraz interaktywną wizualizację wyników w celu zrozumienia zachowania każdego modelu. Kod jest dostępny pod następującym linkiem: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo OCTIS, okvir za obuku, analizu i usporedbu temskih modela, čiji su optimalni hiper-parametri procjenjeni koristeći Bayesijski optimizacijski pristup. Predloženo rešenje uključuje nekoliko modela moderne teme i metrika za procjenu. Ove metrike mogu biti ciljane kao objektivne putem temeljne optimizacijske procedure kako bi se utvrdila najbolja konfiguracija hiper-parametara. OCTIS omogućava istraživačima i praktičnicima da imaju pošteno usporedbe između model a interesa teme, koristeći nekoliko standardnih podataka i poznatih mjera procjene, integriraju nove algoritme i da imaju interaktivnu vizualizaciju rezultata za razumevanje ponašanja svakog modela. Kod je dostupan na sljedećoj vezi: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, prezentăm OCTIS, un cadru de instruire, analiză și comparare a Modelelor Topice, ai căror hiperparametri optimi sunt estimați folosind o abordare Bayesian Optimization. Soluția propusă integrează mai multe modele de subiecte de ultimă generație și măsurători de evaluare. Aceste măsurători pot fi direcționate ca obiectiv de procedura de optimizare subiacentă pentru a determina cea mai bună configurație hiperparametru. OCTIS permite cercetătorilor și practicienilor să aibă o comparație corectă între modelele tematice de interes, folosind mai multe seturi de date de referință și măsuri de evaluare bine cunoscute, să integreze algoritmi noi și să aibă o vizualizare interactivă a rezultatelor pentru înțelegerea comportamentului fiecărui model. Codul este disponibil la următorul link: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'no': 'I denne papiret presenterer vi OCTIS eit rammeverk for opplæring, analysering og sammenligning av temamodeller som er optimal hyper- parametrar anslått med ein Bayesian optimaliseringstilnærming. Det foreslåde løysinga integrerer fleire målmodeller for kunsten og evalueringsmetrikar. Desse metrikane kan gjerast som mål ved den underliggende optimaliseringsprosessen for å bestemme den beste oppsettet av hyper- parametrar. OCTIS lèt forskere og praktiseringar ha ein rett sammenligning mellom temamodeller med interesse, med fleire benchmarkdatasett og godt kjent evalueringsmetrika, for å integrere novel algoritme, og for å ha eit interaktiv visualisering av resultatene for å forstå oppførselen av kvar modell. Koden er tilgjengeleg på denne lenkjen: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ, අපි OCTIS වෙනුවෙන්, ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණය, විශ්ලේෂණය, සහ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ මොඩේල්ස් වලට පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්ණයක් තියෙනවා, ඒ වගේ  ප්\u200dරතිශ්න විස්තර සම්බන්ධ විස්තරය සහ අවශ්\u200dය විස්තාරයක් විසින් ස්ථානයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා. මෙම මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් විදිහට අරමුණ වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පරීක්ෂණ විදිහට හොඳම හායිපර්-පැරැමිටර් සැ OCTIS පරීක්ෂකයෝ සහ ප්\u200dරේක්ෂකයෝ සම්බන්ධ විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න, බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට් සහ හ හොඳින් විද පස්සේ සම්බන්ධයේ කෝඩ ප්\u200dරවේශය තියෙන්නේ: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi OCTIS, ett ramverk för träning, analys och jämförelse av Topic Models, vars optimala hyperparametrar uppskattas med hjälp av en Bayesian Optimization approach. Den föreslagna lösningen integrerar flera toppmoderna temamodeller och utvärderingsmetoder. Dessa mätvärden kan målas som objektiva genom den underliggande optimeringsproceduren för att fastställa den bästa hyperparameterkonfigurationen. OCTIS gör det möjligt för forskare och praktiker att ha en rättvis jämförelse mellan ämnesmodeller av intresse, med hjälp av flera benchmark datauppsättningar och välkända utvärderingsmetoder, att integrera nya algoritmer, och att ha en interaktiv visualisering av resultaten för att förstå beteendet hos varje modell. Koden finns på följande länk: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் OCTIS, பயிற்சி, ஆராய்ச்சி, மற்றும் ஒப்பிடுவதற்கான சட்டம் கொடுக்கிறோம், அதன் விருப்பத்தேர்வு மேல் அளபுருக்கள் பேயி The proposed solution integrates several state-of-the-art topic models and evaluation metrics.  இந்த மெட்ரிக்குகள் சிறந்த ஹைப்பர்- அளபுரு வடிவமைப்பை தீர்மானிக்க கூடிய அடிப்படையில் உள்ள முறைமைப்பு செயலாக இலக் OCTIS ஆராய்ச்சியாளர் மற்றும் பயிற்சியாளர்கள் தேவையான மாதிரிகளுக்கு இடையே ஒரு சரியான ஒப்பீடு இருக்க அனுமதிக்கிறது, பல பென்நிங்கார்க் தரவுகள் மற்றும் நன்றாக அறியப்பட்ட மதிப்பின்  பின்வரும் இணைப்பில் குறியீடு கிடைக்கும்: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaa lagu soo qoraa OCTIS, kaas oo ah framework waxbarasho, analyysiisa, iyo isbarbardhiga modellada Topic, oo ay optimal hyper-parameters lagu qiimeeyo isticmaalka habboon Bayesian Optimization. Qiimeynta la soo jeeday waxay leedahay tusaalooyin badan oo dowladda farshaxanka ah iyo qaab qiimeynta. Midabkan waxaa lagu hagi karaa waxyaabo ku habboon qaababka hoose oo la soconayo si ay u go’aan qaabilaada ugu wanaagsan ee heer-parameter. OCTIS wuxuu u ogolaaday in cilmi-baaritaanta iyo shaqo-bixiyayaasha ay u sameyn karaan si qumman isbarbardhig tusaalayaal xiiseha, isticmaalaya qaar kamid ah taarifka bangiga iyo metriciyada qiimeynta si fiican loo yaqaan, si ay u qabsadaan algorityada saxda iyo in ay u haystaan aragtida midhihiisa si ay u fahanto tababarka model walba. Kaarka waxaa laga helaa xiriirka soo socda: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم OCTIS کو ایک ٹرینگ، تحلیل اور مقایسہ کرنے کے لئے فرمود پیش کرتے ہیں، جس کے optimal hyper-parameters کو Bayesian Optimization approach کے مطابق مطابق مطابق مقایسہ کیا جاتا ہے. پیشنهاد کے حل کے ساتھ بہت سی موجود ٹوپیٹ موڈل اور ارزیابی متریک کو جمع کرتا ہے. یہ میٹریک کو زیادہ اچھی پارامیٹ کی پیدائش کے ذریعے موجب مقرر کر سکتے ہیں۔ OCTIS پھیرنے والوں اور پھیلانے والوں کو مہربانی کے ٹوپ موڈل کے درمیان عادلانہ مقایسہ کرنا اجازت دیتا ہے، بہت سی بنچم مارک ڈاٹ سٹ اور بہت معلوم ارزیابی متریک کے استعمال کرتا ہے، نو الگوریتم کو متحد کرنا، اور ہر موڈل کے رفتار کو سمجھنے کے لئے نتائج کا انتشار فعال کوڈ نیچے لینک میں موجود ہے: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozdagi OCTIS, Mavzu modellarini taʼminlashtirish, analyzer va o'xshash usullarning asosiy parametrlarini Bayezcha Optimization usuli yordamida hisoblash mumkin. The proposed solution integrates several state-of-the-art topic models and evaluation metrics.  Ushbu metriklarni eng yuqori hyper- parametr moslamasini aniqlash uchun asosiy tizim sifatida koʻrsatish mumkin. Name Quyidagi bogʻ: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu OCTIS, một cơ sở để huấn luyện, phân tích, và so sánh các kiểu Topic, mà được đánh giá là siêu tham số tối ưu, dựa trên phương pháp quang giải Bayesian. Giải pháp đề nghị bao gồm các mô hình chủ đề hiện đại và đo hồ sơ đánh giá. Những thước đo này có thể được nhắm vào mục tiêu bằng thủ tục cải thiện cơ bản để xác định cấu hình siêu tham số tốt nhất. Tổ chức này cho phép các nhà nghiên cứu và các chuyên gia so sánh công bằng giữa các mẫu vật lí, sử dụng nhiều bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn và các đo hồ sơ đánh giá nổi tiếng, cho phép hợp tác các thuật to án mới, và có một hình ảnh tương tác về kết quả để hiểu hành vi của mỗi mô hình. The code is available at the following link: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo OCTIS, okvir za obuku, analizu i usporedbu temskih modela, čiji su optimalni hiper-parametri procijenjeni koristeći Bayesianski optimizacijski pristup. Predloženo rješenje uključuje nekoliko modela stanja umjetnosti i metrika procjene. Ove metrike mogu biti ciljane kao objektivne temeljnim postupkom optimizacije kako bi se utvrdila najbolja konfiguracija hiper-parametara. OCTIS omogućava istraživačima i praktičarima da imaju fer usporedbu između temskih model a interesa, koristeći nekoliko standardnih podataka i poznatih mjera procjene, integrirati nove algoritme te imati interaktivnu vizualizaciju rezultata za razumijevanje ponašanja svakog modela. Kod je dostupan na sljedećoj vezi: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия представяме рамка за обучение, анализ и сравняване на Тематични Модели, чиито оптимални хиперпараметри са оценени с помощта на Байсиев подход за оптимизация. Предложеното решение интегрира няколко най-съвременни тематични модела и показатели за оценка. Тези показатели могат да бъдат насочени като цел чрез основната процедура за оптимизация, за да се определи най-добрата конфигурация на хиперпараметри. ОКТИС позволява на изследователите и практикуващите да имат справедливо сравнение между тематичните модели, които представляват интерес, като използват няколко сравнителни набора данни и добре познати показатели за оценка, да интегрират нови алгоритми и да имат интерактивна визуализация на резултатите за разбиране на поведението на всеки модел. Кодът е достъпен на следния линк: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we OCTIS, een framework voor training, analyse en vergelijking van topic modellen, waarvan de optimale hyperparameters worden geschat met behulp van een Bayesian Optimization benadering. De voorgestelde oplossing integreert verschillende state-of-the-art topic modellen en evaluatiestatistieken. Deze statistieken kunnen door de onderliggende optimalisatieprocedure als objectief worden aangepakt om de beste hyperparameterconfiguratie te bepalen. OCTIS stelt onderzoekers en beoefenaars in staat om een eerlijke vergelijking te maken tussen topic modellen van belang, met behulp van verschillende benchmark datasets en bekende evaluatiemetrics, om nieuwe algoritmen te integreren en om een interactieve visualisatie van de resultaten te hebben om het gedrag van elk model te begrijpen. De code is beschikbaar op de volgende link: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi OCTIS, en ramme for træning, analyse og sammenligning af Topic Models, hvis optimale hyperparametre estimeres ved hjælp af en Bayesian Optimization tilgang. Den foreslåede løsning integrerer flere state-of-the-art emnemodeller og evalueringsmetrics. Disse målinger kan målrettes som objektive ved hjælp af den underliggende optimeringsprocedure for at bestemme den bedste konfiguration af hyperparameter. OCTIS giver forskere og praktikere mulighed for at få en rimelig sammenligning mellem emnemodeller af interesse, ved hjælp af flere benchmark datasæt og velkendte evalueringsmetrics, til at integrere nye algoritmer, og til at have en interaktiv visualisering af resultaterne for at forstå adfærden af hver model. Koden er tilgængelig på følgende link: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir OCTIS vor, ein Framework zum Training, Analysieren und Vergleichen von Topic Models, dessen optimale Hyperparameter mit Hilfe eines Bayesischen Optimierungsansatzes geschätzt werden. Die vorgeschlagene Lösung integriert mehrere hochmoderne Themenmodelle und Bewertungsmetriken. Diese Metriken können durch das zugrunde liegende Optimierungsverfahren als objektiv betrachtet werden, um die beste Hyperparameter-Konfiguration zu bestimmen. OCTIS ermöglicht Forschern und Praktikern einen fairen Vergleich zwischen interessanten Themenmodellen unter Verwendung mehrerer Benchmark-Datensätze und bekannter Evaluationsmetriken, die Integration neuartiger Algorithmen und eine interaktive Visualisierung der Ergebnisse zum Verständnis des Verhaltens jedes Modells. Den Code finden Sie unter folgendem Link: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan OCTIS, sebuah rangkaian untuk latihan, analisis, dan membandingkan Model Topik, yang optimal hyperparameter diharapkan menggunakan pendekatan Bayesian Optimization. Solusi yang diusulkan mengintegrasikan beberapa model topik terbaik dan metrik evaluasi. Metrik ini dapat ditujukan sebagai objektif oleh prosedur optimisasi yang didasarkan untuk menentukan konfigurasi hyper parameter terbaik. OCTIS memungkinkan para peneliti dan praktek untuk memiliki perbandingan yang adil antara model topik tertarik, menggunakan beberapa set data benchmark dan metrik evaluasi yang terkenal, untuk mengintegrasi algoritma baru, dan untuk memiliki visualisasi interaktif hasil untuk memahami perilaku masing-masing model. Kode tersedia di link berikut: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 OCTIS를 제시했는데 훈련, 분석과 주제 모델을 비교하는 데 사용되는 구조로 가장 좋은 초파라미터는 베일스 최적화 방법으로 평가한 것이다.제시된 해결 방안은 여러 개의 가장 선진적인 주제 모델과 평가 지표를 통합시켰다.이러한 지표는 기초 최적화 프로그램을 목표로 삼아 최상의 초파라미터 설정을 확정할 수 있다.OCTIS는 연구원과 종사자가 여러 개의 기준 데이터 집합과 유명한 평가 지표를 사용하여 관심 있는 주제 모델 간에 공평한 비교를 하고 새로운 알고리즘을 통합하며 결과를 상호작용적으로 시각화하여 각 모델의 행위를 이해할 수 있도록 한다.다음 링크를 통해 코드를 가져올 수 있습니다.https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunawasilisha OCTIS, mfumo wa mafunzo, uchambuzi, na kuunganisha Model za Madagaska, ambazo parameters optimal za upepo unakadiriwa kwa kutumia mbinu ya Uchaguzi wa Bayesia. suluhisho hilo linajumuisha mifano kadhaa ya hali ya sanaa na njia za uchunguzi. mbinu hizi zinaweza lengwa kama lengo la utaratibu wa upasuaji wa msingi wa kutambua utoaji wa kipimo bora zaidi. OCTIS inaruhusu watafiti na wataalamu kuwa na ulinganisho wa haki kati ya mifano ya maslahi, kwa kutumia seti kadhaa za taarifa za bendera na mitindo inayofahamika vizuri, kuunganisha algorithi za riwaya, na kuweza kuonyesha matokeo yanayotokana na kuelewa tabia za kila muundo. Utawala unapatikana kwenye kiungo kinachofuata: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما OCTIS را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یک چهارچوب برای آموزش، تحلیل و مقایسه کردن مدل\u200cهای موضوع، که پارامترهای optimal hyper-parameters آن را از طریق optimization Bayesian مقایسه می\u200cکند. راه حل پیشنهاد چند مدل موضوع موضوع هنر و ارزیابی متریک را جمع می کند. این متریک\u200cها می\u200cتوانند به عنوان هدف توسط روش optimization پایه هدف داده شوند تا بهترین پیکربندی پارامتر را تعیین کند. OCTIS اجازه می دهد تحقیقات کنندگان و تمرین کنندگان یک مقایسه عادلانه بین مدل\u200cهای موضوع علاقه داشته باشند، با استفاده از چند مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای برچسب و متریک ارزیابی شناخته شده، تا الگوریتم\u200cهای نو را جمع کند، و یک تصویر بینایی از نتایج\u200cها را برای درک رفتار هر مدل داشته باشند. کد در لینک زیر موجود است: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda OCTIS'i beýeziýan optimizasyň ýaryşyny ulanyp, okuw, analyz we çykyş nusgalaryny çykarýarys. Ýüklemek üçin teklip eden çözüm birnäçe sanat nusgasyny we çykyş metriklerini birleştirir. Bu metrikler iň gowy hiper-parameterler yapılandyrmasyny bejermek üçin amaçlary bolup biler. OCTIS araştırmaclaryň we praktikantlaryň meýdançalaryň gyzyklaşyk modalarynyň arasynda adalatly bir hoýgörüşmesini mümkin edýär, birnäçe benchmark veri setirlerini we gowy bilinen deňlenme metrileri ullanýar, novel algoritmalaryny birleştirmek we netijelerini her modelini düşünmek üçin etkileşimli görkezmeleri üçin ru Bu sened aşağıdaki baglaýyşda bar: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.", 'af': "In hierdie papier stel ons OCTIS voor 'n raamwerk vir onderwerp, analyseer en vergelyking van onderwerp modele, wie se optimale hiper-parameters vergelyk word deur 'n Bayesian Optimaliseer toegang te gebruik. Die voorgestelde oplossing integreer verskeie state-of-the-art-onderwerp modele en evalueringsmetries. Hierdie metries kan as objektief gemaak word deur die onderstelde optimaliseeringprosedure om die beste hiper- parameter konfigurasie te bepaal. OCTIS laat resekers en praktisers toe om 'n regverdige vergelyking tussen onderwerp modele van belang te hê, gebruik verskeie benchmark datastelle en goed bekend evalueringsmetries, om novele algoritme te integreer en om 'n interaktief visualisering van die resultate te hê vir verstaan die gedrag van elke model. Die kode is beskikbaar by die volgende skakel: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.", 'am': "በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የባይስያ Optimization ሥርዓት ለመግለጽ፣ ለማስተዋል እና ለመተካከል የጦማር ሞዴላዎችን እናቀርባለን፡፡ በተዘጋጀው ጉዳይ የ-አርእስት አካባቢ አካላት እና ማረጋገጫ ሚትሮዎችን ያስተካክላል፡፡ ምርጫዎች OCTIS allows researchers and practitioners to have a fair comparison between topic models of interest, using several benchmark datasets and well-known evaluation metrics, to integrate novel algorithms, and to have an interactive visualization of the results for understanding the behavior of each model.  ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.", 'az': "Bu kağızda OCTIS'i təhsil, analizi və karşılaşdırmaq üçün bir çerçive göstəririk. Bu kişinin optimal hiper-parametrləri Bayesiya Optimizasyon approach vasitəsilə müəyyən edilir. Önüllü çətinlik bir neçə mövzu modellərini və değerlendirmə metriklərini birləşdirir. Bu metriklərin ən yaxşı hiper-parametru konfigurasiyasını təyin etmək üçün düzgün optimizasyon prosedüsü ilə müəyyən edilə bilər. OCTIS araştırmacılara və praktikçilərə məsələlərin dəyişiklik modellərinin arasında ədalətli bir komparaşdırmasına izin verir, bir çox benchmark veri qurğularını və tanınmış değerlendirmə metriklərini istifadə edər, yeni algoritmini birləşdirmək və hər modelinin davranışlarını anlamaq üçün müxtəlif bir vizualizasyon olar. Kod aşağıdaki bağlantıda faydalanır: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.", 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ওসিটিএস-কে উপস্থাপন করি, প্রশিক্ষণ, বিশ্লেষণ এবং তুলনা করার একটি ফ্রেম কার্যক্রম, যার অপটিমেল হাইপার-প্যারামিটার বেয়েশিয়ান অপটি প্রস্তাবিত সমাধান বেশ কয়েকটি রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের বিষয়বস্তু মডেল এবং মূল্যায়ন মেট্রিকে একত্রিত করে। এই মেট্রিকের উদ্দেশ্য হিসেবে লক্ষ্য করা যাবে নিম্নলিখিত অপারেশন প্রক্রিয়ার দ্বারা সেরা হাইপার-প্যারামার কনফ অসিটিআইএস অনুমতি দিয়েছেন গবেষক এবং প্রযুক্তিদের মধ্যে সুন্দর তুলনা করার, বেশ কয়েকটি বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেট এবং পরিচিত মূল্য মেট্রিক ব্যবহার করে, নোভেল অ্যালগরিদম একত্রিত করার এবং প্রত নিম্নলিঙ্কে কোড পাওয়া যাচ্ছে: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo OCTIS, okvir za obuku, analizu i usporedbu temskih modela, čiji se optimalni hiper-parametri procjenjuju koristeći Bayesijski optimizacijski pristup. Predloženo rješenje uključuje nekoliko modela stanja umjetnosti i metrika procjene. Ove metrike mogu biti ciljane kao objektivne putem temeljne optimizacijske postupke kako bi se utvrdila najbolja konfiguracija hiper-parametara. OCTIS omogućava istraživačima i praktičarima da imaju fer usporedbu između temskih model a interesa, koristeći nekoliko standardnih podataka i dobro poznatih mjera procjene, integrirati nove algoritme i imati interaktivnu vizualizaciju rezultata za razumijevanje ponašanja svakog modela. Kod je dostupan na sljedećoj vezi: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'ca': "En aquest paper, presentem OCTIS, un marc per a formar, analitzar i comparar Models Tépics, dels quals s'estiman els hiperpàmetres optims fent servir un enfocament d'optimització bayèsia. La solució proposta integra varis models de tema més avançats i mètriques d'evaluació. Aquestes mètriques poden ser mirades com a objectius pel procés d'optimització subjacent per determinar la millor configuració de hiper-paràmetres. OCTIS permet als investigadors i practicants tenir una comparació justa entre els models de tema d'interès, utilitzant diversos conjunts de dades de referència i les mètriques d'evaluació conegudes, per integrar algoritmes nous i tenir una visualització interactiva dels resultats per entendre el comportament de cada model. El codi està disponible en el següent enllaç: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme OCTIS, rámec pro trénink, analýzu a porovnávání tématických modelů, jejichž optimální hyperparametry jsou odhadnuty pomocí Bayesovského optimalizačního přístupu. Navržené řešení integruje několik nejmodernějších tématických modelů a hodnotících metrik. Tyto metriky mohou být cíleny jako objektivní pomocí základního optimalizačního postupu pro určení nejlepší konfigurace hyperparametrů. OCTIS umožňuje výzkumníkům a odborníkům mít spravedlivé srovnání mezi zajímavými tématickými modely s využitím několika referenčních datových sad a známých hodnotících metrik, integrovat nové algoritmy a mít interaktivní vizualizaci výsledků pro porozumění chování jednotlivých modelů. Kód je k dispozici na následujícím odkazu: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustame OCTIS raamistikku teemamudelite koolitamiseks, analüüsimiseks ja võrdlemiseks, mille optimaalseid hüperparameetreid hinnatakse bayesia optimeerimise lähenemisviisi abil. Kavandatud lahendus hõlmab mitmeid kaasaegseid teemamudeleid ja hindamismeetodeid. Neid mõõdikuid saab eesmärgina sihtida aluseks oleva optimeerimisprotseduuri abil, et määrata kindlaks parim hüperparameetrite konfiguratsioon. OCTIS võimaldab teadlastel ja praktikutel õiglaselt võrrelda huvipakkuvaid teemamudeleid, kasutades mitmeid võrdlusandmekogumeid ja tuntud hindamismeetodeid, integreerida uudseid algoritme ja omada tulemuste interaktiivset visualiseerimist iga mudeli käitumise mõistmiseks. Kood on kättesaadav järgmisel lingil: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme OCTIS-viitekehyksen aihemallien kouluttamiseen, analysointiin ja vertailuun, jonka optimaaliset hyperparametrit arvioidaan Bayesian Optimization -menetelmällä. Ehdotettu ratkaisu yhdistää useita huippuluokan aihemalleja ja arviointimittareita. Nämä mittarit voidaan kohdistaa objektiivisesti taustalla olevalla optimointimenettelyllä parhaan hyperparametrimäärityksen määrittämiseksi. OCTIS mahdollistaa tutkijoiden ja ammattilaisten tasapuolisen vertailun kiinnostavien aihemallien välillä käyttämällä useita vertailuaineistoja ja tunnettuja arviointimittareita, integroida uusia algoritmeja ja saada interaktiivisen visualisoinnin tuloksista ymmärtämään kunkin mallin käyttäytymistä. Koodi on saatavilla seuraavasta linkistä: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'hy': 'In this paper, we present OCTIS, a framework for training, analyzing, and comparing Topic Models, whose optimal hyper-parameters are estimated using a Bayesian Optimization approach.  Պատրաստված լուծումը ինտեգրում է մի քանի նորագույն թեմային մոդելներ և գնահատման մետրեր: Այս մետրիկները կարելի է նպատակել որպես օբյեկտիվ հիմնական օպտիմացման գործընթացի միջոցով լավագույն հիպեր-պարամետրերի կառուցվածքը որոշելու համար: OCTIS-ը թույլ է տալիս հետազոտողներին և մասնագետներին ունենալ արդարացի համեմատություն հետաքրքրության թեմային մոդելների միջև, օգտագործելով բազմաթիվ համեմատական տվյալների համակարգեր և հայտնի գնահատման մետրիկներ, ինտեգրելով նոր ալգորիթմներ և ունենալով ինտերակտիվ տեսողականություն արդյու Կոդը հասանելի է հետևյալ հղում. https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim OCTIS, një kuadër për trajnimin, analizimin dhe krahasimin e Modeleve Topike, të cilat optimale hyperparametra vlerësohen duke përdorur një qasje optimizuese Bayesian. Zgjidhja e propozuar integron disa modele tematike më të larta dhe metrika vlerësimi. Këto metrika mund të synohen si objektiv nga procedura optimizuese bazë për të përcaktuar konfigurimin më të mirë të hiper-parametrave. OCTIS lejon kërkuesit dhe praktikantët të kenë një krahasim të drejtë midis modeleve tematike të interesit, duke përdorur disa baza të dhënash dhe metrika të njohura vlerësimi, për të integruar algoritme të reja dhe për të patur një vizualizim interaktiv të rezultateve për të kuptuar sjelljen e çdo modeli. Kodi është në dispozicion në lidhjen e ardhshme: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים OCTIS, מסגרת לאימון, ניתוח, ושווה מודלים נושאיים, שהפרמטרים היפר אופטימיים שלהם מוערכים באמצעות גישה אופטימיזציה בייזית. הפתרון המוצע מכיל מספר מודלים נושאים חדשים ומטריות הערכה. המטריקות האלה יכולות להיות המטרה כאובייקטיבית על ידי הליך אופטימיזציה המרכזי כדי לקבוע את ההייפרפרמטר הטוב ביותר. OCTIS מאפשר למחקרים ומפעילים להשוות הוגן בין דוגמנים נושאים של עניין, בשימוש במספר קבוצות נתונים של רמזים ומטריקות הערכה הידועות, להשתלב אלגוריתמים חדשים, ולקבל ויזואליזציה אינטראקטיבית של התוצאות להבין התנהגות של כל דוגמן. הקוד זמין בקשר הבא: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da OATIS, wata firam wa yin wa'azi, Ana yi rarraba, kuma masu sami da Models na Maɓaki, wanda ke da amfani da shirin Optimisation na Bayesian. Tsarin da aka buɗe shi yana haɗa wasu masu cikin-state-of-the-art samu'õ'in madaidaici da taki'a. Wannan metric za'a yi amfani da shi kamar abun da ke ƙari a ƙayyade tsarin da za'a ƙayyade mafi kyaun zauren-parameter. OATIS na yarda da watan da masu amfani da su sami daidai a tsakanin misãlai masu amfani da masu amfani da, a yi amfani da wasu zane-zane-zane-zane da masu sani, ya haɗa algoritori masu basu'a, kuma ya sami wani sura mai amfani da matsalan su dõmin su fahimta aikin each motel. Kodi yana da cikin shirin da ke jẽre: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.", 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo OCTIS, okvir za usposabljanje, analizo in primerjavo tematskih modelov, katerih optimalni hiperparametri so ocenjeni z bayesijskim pristopom optimizacije. Predlagana rešitev vključuje več najsodobnejših tematskih modelov in meritev vrednotenja. Te meritve je mogoče ciljno usmeriti z osnovnim postopkom optimizacije, da se določi najboljša konfiguracija hiperparametrov. OCTIS omogoča raziskovalcem in strokovnjakom pošteno primerjavo med tematskimi modeli, ki jih zanima, z uporabo več referenčnih naborov podatkov in znanih ocenjevalnih metrik, integracijo novih algoritmov in interaktivno vizualizacijo rezultatov za razumevanje vedenja posameznega modela. Koda je na voljo na naslednji povezavi: https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'bo': 'In this paper, we present OCTIS, a framework for training, analyzing, and comparing Topic Models, whose optimal hyper-parameters are estimated using a Bayesian Optimization approach. The proposed solution integrates several state-of-the-art topic models and evaluation metrics. These metrics can be targeted as objective by the underlying optimization procedure to determine the best hyper-parameter configuration. OCTIS allows researchers and practitioners to have a fair comparison between topic models of interest, using several benchmark datasets and well-known evaluation metrics, to integrate novel algorithms, and to have an interactive visualization of the results for understanding the behavior of each model. Note that this is a practical one for example. འོག་གི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ནང་ཨང་འདི་སྤྱོད་པ： https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.', 'jv': 'In this paper, we present OCTIS, a frame for testing, testing, and komparaging Subject Modes, whose Optical-parameters are asserting use a bayesi Optimisation method. Laptop" and "Desktop This Metric can be goal as goal by the underfalsing Optimisation method to define the top iper-parameters configuration. OCTIS Peringatan permaneh kamu kamu akeh lan pratiker tentang karo perusahaan gambar model sing ngengabung, gambar perusahaan bench dataset karo akeh-perusahaan meter, ditambah perusahaan Algorithm sing nganggo gambar, lan akeh perusahaan iso nggawe barang langgar sami model. Gujaring https://github.com/MIND-Lab/OCTIS.'}
{'en': 'Breaking Writer’s Block : Low-cost Fine-tuning of Natural Language Generation Models', 'fr': "Breaking Writer's Block\xa0: peaufinage à faible coût des modèles de génération de langage naturel", 'es': 'Rompiendo el bloqueo del escritor: ajuste fino de bajo costo de los modelos de generación de lenguaje natural', 'ja': "Breaking Writer 's Block: Low - Cost Fineing of Natural Language Generation Models", 'pt': 'Quebrando o bloqueio do escritor: ajuste fino de baixo custo de modelos de geração de linguagem natural', 'ar': 'كسر كتلة الكاتب: ضبط دقيق منخفض التكلفة لنماذج توليد اللغة الطبيعية', 'zh': '破家之障:自然语言生模低成本微调', 'ru': "Breaking Writer 's Block: Низкозатратная тонкая настройка моделей генерации естественного языка", 'ga': 'Briseadh Bloc an Scríbhneora: Mionchoigeartú ar chostas íseal ar Mhúnlaí Giniúint Teanga Nádúrtha', 'hi': 'लेखक के ब्लॉक को तोड़ना: प्राकृतिक भाषा पीढ़ी मॉडल की कम लागत वाली ठीक-ट्यूनिंग', 'hu': "Breaking Writer's Block: A természetes nyelv generálási modellek finomhangolása alacsony költségű", 'el': 'Σπάζοντας το μπλοκ συγγραφέων: Χαμηλού κόστους τελειοποίηση των μοντέλων δημιουργίας φυσικής γλώσσας', 'ka': 'წერილის ბლოკის გაშვება: ნაკლები კონფიგური წერილის მოდელების შექმნა', 'it': "Breaking Writer's Block: ottimizzazione a basso costo dei modelli di generazione del linguaggio naturale", 'lt': "Breaking Writer's Block: Low-cost Fine-tuning of Natural Language Generation Models", 'mk': 'Бришење на блокот на писателот: Нискоценско финансирање на природните модели за генерација на јазик', 'ms': 'Blok Penulis Mempecahkan: Penyesuaian Terbaik dengan kos rendah bagi Model Jenerasi Bahasa Biasa', 'ml': 'എഴുതുന്നതിന്റെ ബ്ലോക്ക്: സ്വാഭാവ ഭാഷയുടെ ജനിപ്പിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകളുടെ കുറഞ്ഞ വിലയ്ക്കുള്ള സുഖമായി', 'mt': 'Il-Blokk tal-Kbir li Jitkisser: Aġġustament Irfinat bi prezz baxx tal-Mudelli tal-Ġenerazzjoni tal-Lingwi Naturali', 'mn': 'Бичигчийн блок: Байгалийн хэл төрүүлэх загварын бага үнэтэй төлөвлөгөө', 'no': "Breaking Writer' s Block: Low- cost Fine- tuning of Natural Language Generation Models", 'pl': 'Przełamanie bloku pisarza: Niskie dostrajanie modeli generowania języka naturalnego', 'ro': "Breaking Writer's Block: Reglarea fină a modelelor de generare a limbajului natural cu costuri reduse", 'si': 'ලේඛකයේ බ්ලෝක් විනාශ කරනවා: ප්\u200dරාකෘතික භාෂාව නිර්මාණය නිර්මාණය', 'so': "Breaking Writer's Block: Low-cost Fine-tuning of Natural language Generation Models", 'sr': 'Slomljeni blok pisaca: niska koštana fina prilagodba modela generacije prirodnog jezika', 'sv': "Breaking Writer's Block: Prisvärd finjustering av modeller för generering av naturligt språk", 'ta': 'எழுத்தாளரின் தொகுதியை முறித்துவிடுகிறது: சாதாரண மொழி உருவாக்கும் மாதிரி', 'ur': 'روائٹر کا بلاک ٹوٹ کر رہا ہے: کم کم کم کم قیمت نیکی زبان پیدائش موڈل', 'kk': 'Жазушының блогы бөлу: Тәуелді тілді құру үлгілерін төмен бағалау', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Cửa s ổ soạn văn bản: Đặt ít giá trị tinh chỉnh Ngôn ngữ tự nhiên', 'bg': 'Прекъсване на блока на писателя: Ниска цена фина настройка на моделите за генериране на естествен език', 'hr': 'Slomljeni blok pisača: niska troškova fino navedenje modela generacije prirodnog jezika', 'da': "Breaking Writer's Block: Billig finjustering af modeller til generering af natursprog", 'nl': "Writer's Block doorbreken: Low-cost fine-tuning van Natural Language Generation Modellen", 'de': "Writer's Block brechen: Low-Cost Feinabstimmung von Modellen zur Generierung natürlicher Sprache", 'id': "Breaking Writer's Block: Penyesuaian Sedikit Biasa Model Generasi Bahasa Alami", 'fa': 'شکستن بلوک نویسنده: مدل تولید زبان طبیعی کم هزینه', 'ko': '저자의 장애 타파: 자연 언어 생성 모델의 저비용 조정', 'sw': 'Blogu ya Kuvunja Mwandishi: Uzalishaji wa Lugha za asili', 'tr': 'Yazıcının Bloğu: Täbiş Dil Beşirme Modelleri', 'af': 'Breek Skrifter se blok: Lae- koste Fine- tuning van Natuurlike Taal Generering Modele', 'sq': 'Bloku i shkrimtarit të thyer: rregullimi me kosto të ulët i modeleve të gjenerimit të gjuhës natyrore', 'am': 'የጽሑፍ አቀማመጥ', 'hy': 'Բնական լեզուների ստեղծման մոդելների ցածր արժեքը', 'az': 'Yazıcının bloğunu qırır: Təbiətli Dil Generasiya Modellərinin düşük maliyyəti', 'bn': 'লেখকের ব্লক ভেঙ্গে ফেলা হচ্ছে: স্বাভাবিক ভাষা প্রজন্ম মোডেলের নিম্নলিখিত ব্লক', 'ca': "Breaking Writer's Block: Un ajustament baix de costos dels models de generació de llenguatges naturals", 'bs': 'Slomljeni blok pisača: niska troškova dobra prilagodba modela generacije prirodnog jezika', 'cs': 'Rozbíjení spisovatelského bloku: Nízkonákladové jemné ladění modelů generace přirozeného jazyka', 'et': 'Kirjutaja bloki murdmine: loodusliku keele generatsiooni mudelite odav peen häälestamine', 'fi': "Breaking Writer's Block: Edullinen hienosäätö Natural Language Generation Models", 'jv': 'Ngubah Perkakas Balik: Minggo-kosong Fine-tuning of Normal Language Generation model', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Prekinitev bloka pisatelja: Nizkocenovno fino nastavitev modelov generiranja naravnega jezika', 'he': 'Block של כותב שבר: התאמה נמוכה של מודלים ליצירת שפות טבעיות', 'bo': "Breaking Writer's Block: Low-cost Fine-tuning of Natural Language Generation Models"}
{'en': 'It is standard procedure these days to solve Information Extraction task by fine-tuning large pre-trained language models. This is not the case for generation task, which relies on a variety of techniques for controlled language generation. In this paper, we describe a system that fine-tunes a natural language generation model for the problem of solving writer’s block. The fine-tuning changes the conditioning to also include the right context in addition to the left context, as well as an optional list of entities, the size, the genre and a summary of the paragraph that the human author wishes to generate. Our proposed fine-tuning obtains excellent results, even with a small number of epochs and a total cost of USD 150. The system can be accessed as a web-service and all the code is released. A video showcasing the interface and the model is also available.', 'es': 'Hoy en día, es un procedimiento estándar resolver la tarea de extracción de información mediante el ajuste fino de grandes modelos de lenguaje preentrenados. Este no es el caso de la tarea de generación, que se basa en una variedad de técnicas para la generación controlada del lenguaje. En este artículo, describimos un sistema que ajusta un modelo de generación de lenguaje natural para resolver el bloqueo del escritor. El ajuste fino cambia el condicionamiento para incluir también el contexto correcto además del contexto izquierdo, así como una lista opcional de entidades, el tamaño, el género y un resumen del párrafo que el autor humano desea generar. Nuestra puesta a punto propuesta obtiene excelentes resultados, incluso con un número reducido de épocas y un coste total de 150 USD. Se puede acceder al sistema como un servicio web y se libera todo el código. También hay disponible un vídeo que muestra la interfaz y el modelo.', 'pt': 'Atualmente, é um procedimento padrão resolver a tarefa de extração de informações ajustando grandes modelos de linguagem pré-treinados. Este não é o caso da tarefa de geração, que depende de uma variedade de técnicas para geração de linguagem controlada. Neste artigo, descrevemos um sistema que ajusta um modelo de geração de linguagem natural para o problema de resolver o bloqueio de escritor. O ajuste fino altera o condicionamento para incluir também o contexto direito além do contexto esquerdo, bem como uma lista opcional de entidades, o tamanho, o gênero e um resumo do parágrafo que o autor humano deseja gerar. Nosso ajuste fino proposto obtém excelentes resultados, mesmo com um pequeno número de épocas e um custo total de US$ 150. O sistema pode ser acessado como um web-service e todo o código é liberado. Um vídeo mostrando a interface e o modelo também está disponível.', 'fr': "De nos jours, la procédure standard consiste à résoudre la tâche d'extraction d'informations en peaufinant de grands modèles linguistiques pré-entraînés. Ce n'est pas le cas pour la tâche de génération, qui repose sur diverses techniques de génération de langage contrôlé. Dans cet article, nous décrivons un système qui affine un modèle de génération de langage naturel pour résoudre le problème du blocage de l'écrivain. Le réglage fin modifie le conditionnement pour inclure également le contexte droit en plus du contexte gauche, ainsi qu'une liste facultative d'entités, la taille, le genre et un résumé du paragraphe que l'auteur humain souhaite générer. Le réglage fin que nous proposons permet d'obtenir d'excellents résultats, même avec un petit nombre d'époques et un coût total de 150 dollars américains. Le système est accessible en tant que service Web et tout le code est publié. Une vidéo présentant l'interface et le modèle est également disponible.", 'ja': '大規模な事前にトレーニングされた言語モデルを微調整することで、情報抽出タスクを解決するのが最近の標準的な手順です。これは、制御された言語生成のためにさまざまな技術に依存する生成タスクには当てはまりません。本稿では，ライターのブロック問題を解くための自然言語生成モデルを微調整するシステムについて述べる。この微調整は、左コンテキストに加えて、適切なコンテキスト、ならびに人間の著者が生成したいエンティティ、サイズ、ジャンル、および段落の要約の任意のリストも含むように条件付けを変更する。当社の提案された微調整は、少ないエポック数と総コスト150米ドルでも優れた結果を得ています。システムはWebサービスとしてアクセスでき、すべてのコードがリリースされます。インターフェースとモデルを紹介するビデオも用意されています。', 'ar': 'إنه إجراء قياسي في هذه الأيام لحل مهمة استخراج المعلومات من خلال ضبط نماذج اللغة الكبيرة المدربة مسبقًا. ليس هذا هو الحال بالنسبة لمهمة التوليد ، والتي تعتمد على مجموعة متنوعة من التقنيات لتوليد اللغة الخاضعة للرقابة. في هذه الورقة ، نصف نظامًا يقوم بضبط نموذج توليد اللغة الطبيعية لمشكلة حل كتلة الكاتب. يغير الضبط التكييف ليشمل أيضًا السياق الصحيح بالإضافة إلى السياق الأيسر ، بالإضافة إلى قائمة اختيارية للكيانات والحجم والنوع وملخص الفقرة التي يرغب المؤلف البشري في إنشائها. يحقق الضبط الدقيق المقترح نتائج ممتازة ، حتى مع وجود عدد قليل من العصور وتكلفة إجمالية قدرها 150 دولارًا أمريكيًا. يمكن الوصول إلى النظام كخدمة ويب ويتم تحرير جميع التعليمات البرمجية. يتوفر أيضًا مقطع فيديو يعرض الواجهة والنموذج.', 'hi': 'यह इन दिनों बड़े पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल को ठीक-ट्यूनिंग करके सूचना निष्कर्षण कार्य को हल करने के लिए मानक प्रक्रिया है। यह पीढ़ी के कार्य के लिए मामला नहीं है, जो नियंत्रित भाषा पीढ़ी के लिए विभिन्न तकनीकों पर निर्भर करता है। इस पेपर में, हम एक ऐसी प्रणाली का वर्णन करते हैं जो लेखक के ब्लॉक को हल करने की समस्या के लिए एक प्राकृतिक भाषा पीढ़ी मॉडल को ठीक करती है। फाइन-ट्यूनिंग कंडीशनिंग को बाएं संदर्भ के अलावा सही संदर्भ को भी शामिल करने के लिए बदलदेती है, साथ ही साथ संस्थाओं की एक वैकल्पिक सूची, आकार, शैली और पैराग्राफ का सारांश जो मानव लेखक उत्पन्न करना चाहता है। हमारा प्रस्तावित फाइन-ट्यूनिंग उत्कृष्ट परिणाम प्राप्त करता है, यहां तक कि कम संख्या में युगों और 150 अमरीकी डालर की कुल लागत के साथ भी। सिस्टम को वेब-सेवा के रूप में एक्सेस किया जा सकता है और सभी कोड जारी किए जाते हैं। इंटरफ़ेस और मॉडल का प्रदर्शन करने वाला एक वीडियो भी उपलब्ध है।', 'zh': '今以微调大预训练言语模形以决信息提取者,程程也。 生事者不然,赖百术以成受控言。 本文述一统,当系统针编写器块微调自然语言生成模样。 变易之理,左上下文之外,兼正上下文,及人欲成之体,大小流段落摘要之表。 微言得色,虽少纪元150美元之总成本。 其可以为Web访问,而一切代码皆已发矣。 共展界面视频。', 'ru': 'Это стандартная процедура в наши дни для решения задачи извлечения информации путем тонкой настройки больших предварительно обученных языковых моделей. Это не относится к задаче генерации, которая опирается на различные методы для контролируемой генерации языка. В данной работе мы описываем систему, которая тонко настраивает модель генерации естественного языка для решения задачи писательского блока. Точная настройка изменяет условие, чтобы также включать правильный контекст в дополнение к левому контексту, а также необязательный список сущностей, размер, жанр и краткое изложение абзаца, который человеческий автор хочет сгенерировать. Наша предлагаемая тонкая настройка дает отличные результаты, даже с небольшим количеством эпох и общей стоимостью 150 долларов США. Система доступна в виде веб-сервиса, и весь код выпускается. Также доступно видео, демонстрирующее интерфейс и модель.', 'ga': 'Is gnáthnós imeachta é na laethanta seo chun tasc Astarraingthe Faisnéise a réiteach trí mhionchoigeartú a dhéanamh ar mhúnlaí móra teanga réamhoilte. Ní hé seo an cás maidir le tasc giniúna, a bhraitheann ar theicnící éagsúla chun teanga rialaithe a ghiniúint. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid cur síos ar chóras a dhéanann mionchoigeartú ar mhúnla giniúna teanga nádúrtha chun an fhadhb a bhaineann le bloc scríbhneora a réiteach. Athraíonn an mionchoigeartú an riochtú chun an comhthéacs ceart a chur san áireamh chomh maith leis an gcomhthéacs clé, chomh maith le liosta roghnach eintiteas, an méid, an seánra agus achoimre ar an mír is mian leis an údar daonna a ghiniúint. Faigheann ár mionchoigeartú molta torthaí iontacha, fiú le líon beag tréimhsí agus costas iomlán de USD 150. Is féidir an córas a rochtain mar sheirbhís gréasáin agus scaoiltear an cód ar fad. Tá físeán a thaispeánann an comhéadan agus an tsamhail ar fáil freisin.', 'ka': 'ამ დღეში ინფორმაციის ექსტრექციის პარამეტრების გარეშე სტანდარტატური პროცექტია, რომელიც უფრო დიდი წინატრექტირებული ენის მოდელების გარეშე ეს არა შემთხვევაში, რომელიც კონტროლურად ენის წარმოდგენისთვის განსხვავებული ტექნექციების შესახებ. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ აღწერეთ სისტემა, რომელიც ნაირადი ენერგიის წარმოდგენის მოდელს წარმოდგენისთვის პრობლემის გადაწყვებას. მარჯვენა კონტექსტის დამატებით მარჯვენა კონტექსტის კონტექსტის კონტექსტის კონტექსტის კონტექსტის კონტექსტის კონტექსტის კონტექსტის კონტექსტის კონტექსტის შესახებ ჩვენი წარმოადგილებული კონფიგურაცია მიიღება უკეთესი წარმოდგენები, მარტივი რაოდენობით ეპოფებით და ყველა უდრის 150 დონე. Name ვიდეო ჩვენება ინტერფექტის და მოდელს შესაძლებელია.', 'el': 'Είναι τυπική διαδικασία αυτές τις μέρες για να επιλυθεί το έργο εξαγωγής πληροφοριών με την τελειοποίηση μεγάλων προ-εκπαιδευμένων προτύπων γλώσσας. Αυτό δεν ισχύει για την εργασία δημιουργίας, η οποία βασίζεται σε μια ποικιλία τεχνικών για την ελεγχόμενη παραγωγή γλωσσών. Σε αυτή την εργασία, περιγράφουμε ένα σύστημα που συντονίζει ένα μοντέλο δημιουργίας φυσικής γλώσσας για το πρόβλημα της επίλυσης του μπλοκ συγγραφέων. Η τελειοποίηση αλλάζει τον όρο ώστε να περιλαμβάνει και το δεξί πλαίσιο εκτός από το αριστερό πλαίσιο, καθώς και μια προαιρετική λίστα οντοτήτων, το μέγεθος, το είδος και μια περίληψη της παραγράφου που ο ανθρώπινος συγγραφέας επιθυμεί να δημιουργήσει. Η προτεινόμενη τελειοποίηση επιτυγχάνει άριστα αποτελέσματα, ακόμη και με μικρό αριθμό εποχών και συνολικό κόστος του 150. Το σύστημα είναι προσβάσιμο ως υπηρεσία ιστού και απελευθερώνεται όλος ο κώδικας. Ένα βίντεο που παρουσιάζει τη διεπαφή και το μοντέλο είναι επίσης διαθέσιμο.', 'hu': 'Manapság szokásos eljárás az információkivonás feladatának megoldása nagy, előre képzett nyelvi modellek finomhangolásával. Nem ez a helyzet a generációs feladatokra, amelyek számos technikát használnak az ellenőrzött nyelv generálásához. Ebben a tanulmányban egy olyan rendszert írunk le, amely finomhangolja a természetes nyelv generációs modellt az írói blokk megoldásának problémájára. A finomhangolás megváltoztatja a kondicionálást, hogy a bal kontextus mellett a jobb kontextust is magában foglalja, valamint az entitások opcionális listáját, méretét, műfaját és az emberi szerző által létrehozani kívánt bekezdés összefoglalását. Javasolt finomhangolásunk kiváló eredményeket ér el, még kevés korszak esetén is, összköltsége 150 USD. A rendszer internetes szolgáltatásként érhető el, és az összes kód kiadásra kerül. Az interfészt és a modellt bemutató videó is elérhető.', 'it': "In questi giorni è una procedura standard per risolvere l'attività di estrazione delle informazioni ottimizzando grandi modelli linguistici pre-addestrati. Questo non è il caso del compito di generazione, che si basa su una varietà di tecniche per la generazione controllata del linguaggio. In questo articolo, descriviamo un sistema che perfeziona un modello di generazione del linguaggio naturale per il problema della risoluzione del blocco dello scrittore. La messa a punto cambia il condizionamento per includere anche il contesto destro oltre al contesto sinistro, oltre a un elenco facoltativo di entità, la dimensione, il genere e una sintesi del paragrafo che l'autore umano desidera generare. La nostra messa a punto proposta ottiene ottimi risultati, anche con un piccolo numero di epoche e un costo totale di 150 USD. Il sistema è accessibile come servizio web e tutto il codice viene rilasciato. È disponibile anche un video che mostra l'interfaccia e il modello.", 'lt': 'Šiuo metu yra standartinė procedūra, skirta išspręsti informacijos gavimo užduotį tikslinant didelius iš anksto parengtus kalbų modelius. Tai netaikoma gamybos užduotims, kurios grindžiamos įvairiais kontroliuojamos kalbos gamybos metodais. Šiame dokumente apibūdiname sistemą, kuri patobulina natūralų kalbų kūrimo model į rašytojo bloko sprendimo problemai spręsti. Taikant patobulinimą keičiama sąlyga taip pat įtraukiant teisingą kontekstą, be kairiojo konteksto, taip pat neprivalomą subjektų sąrašą, dydį, genrą ir straipsnio santrauką, kurią žmogaus autorius nori sukurti. Mūsų siūlomas patobulinimas gauna puikius rezultatus, net ir nedideliu epokų skaičiumi ir bendra 150 JAV dolerių kaina. The system can be accessed as a web-service and all the code is released.  Taip pat galima rasti vaizdo įrašą, rodantį sąsają ir model į.', 'mk': 'Во овие денови е стандардна процедура за решавање на задачата за извлекување информации со финетизирање на големите предобучени јазички модели. Ова не е случај за генерација на задачи, кои се потпираат на различни техники за контролирана генерација на јазици. Во овој весник, опишуваме систем кој го поправи природниот модел на генерација на јазици за проблемот со решавањето на блокот на писателот. Фино-прилагодувањето го менува условувањето за да го вклучи и десниот контекст, покрај левиот контекст, како и опционална листа на ентитети, големината, џенерот и резултатот на параграфот кој човекот автор сака да го генерира. Нашето предложено финетизирање добива одлични резултати, дури и со мал број епохи и вкупна цена од 150 американски долари. The system can be accessed as a web-service and all the code is released.  Исто така е достапно и видео кое го прикажува интерфејсот и моделот.', 'kk': 'Бұл күндер мәліметті тарқату тапсырмасын үлкен тіл үлгілерін баптау арқылы стандартты процедур. Бұл тілді құру тапсырмасының әртүрлі түрлі техникаларына тәуелді емес. Бұл қағазда, жазушылардың блогын шешу мәселесінің тәуелді тілді құру үлгісін жасайтын жүйесін таңдаймыз. Сол жақтағы контексті қосымша оң жақтағы контексті қосымша, және қосымша нысандар тізімі, өлшемі, жанры және адамның авторының құрылғысын қалайтын айдардың тұжырымдығын қосымша өзгертеді. Біздің ұсынысымыз жақсы түзету нәтижелерін, бірақ олардың кішкентай саны және жалпы бағасы 150 доллар. Жүйе веб- қызметі ретінде қатынауға болады және барлық код шығарылады. Интерфейсті және моделі көрсетілетін видео қолданылады.', 'ms': 'Ia adalah prosedur piawai hari ini untuk menyelesaikan tugas Ekstraksi Maklumat dengan menyesuaikan model bahasa besar yang dilatih dahulu. Ini bukan kes untuk tugas generasi, yang bergantung pada pelbagai teknik untuk generasi bahasa terkawal. Dalam kertas ini, kita menggambarkan sistem yang menyesuaikan model generasi bahasa biasa untuk masalah penyelesaian blok penulis. Penyesuaian halus mengubah kondisi untuk termasuk konteks kanan selain konteks kiri, serta senarai pilihan entiti, saiz, genre dan ringkasan paragraf yang penulis manusia ingin menghasilkan. Penyesuaian kami diusulkan mendapatkan hasil yang baik, walaupun dengan sejumlah kecil epok dan jumlah harga $150. Sistem boleh diakses sebagai perkhidmatan-web dan semua kod dilepaskan. Video yang menunjukkan antaramuka dan model juga tersedia.', 'ml': 'ഈ ദിവസം വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എക്രാക്ട്രേക്ഷന്\u200d ജോലി പരിഹരിക്കുവാന്\u200d സാധാരണ പ്രക്രിയയാണിത്. മുന്\u200dപരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ നിയന്ത്രിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷയുടെ തലമുറതലമുറയ്ക്കുള്ള വ്യത്യസ്തികവിദ്യയില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന ഒരുപാട്  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു സിസ്റ്റം വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ തലമുറയുടെ മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dണയിക്കുന്നു. എഴുത ഇടതുഭാഗത്തുള്ള സംസ്ഥാനത്തിനു ശേഷം വലതുഭാഗത്തേക്കുള്ള നിലപാടുകള്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നു. മറ്റൊരു ഐച്ഛികമായ വസ്തുക്കളുടെ പട്ടികയും, വലിപ്പം, ജനറിയും മനുഷ്യന നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ചിരുന്നത് നല്ല കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് നല്ല ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭിക്കുന്നു. ചെറിയ എപ്പോക്കുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ടും 150 ഡോള വെബ്- സേവനത്താല്\u200d സിസ്റ്റം ലഭ്യമല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d പിന്നെ എല്ലാ കോഡും വിടുന്നു. ഇന്റര്\u200dമുഖം കാണിക്കുന്ന ഒരു വീഡിയോ പിന്നെ മോഡല്\u200d ലഭ്യമാണ്.', 'mt': 'Illum il-ġurnata hija proċedura standard biex jiġi solvut il-kompitu ta’ estrazzjoni ta’ informazzjoni billi jiġu aġġustati mudelli kbar ta’ lingwa mħarrġa minn qabel. Dan mhuwiex il-każ għall-kompitu ta’ ġenerazzjoni, li jiddependi fuq varjetà ta’ tekniki għall-ġenerazzjoni kkontrollata tal-lingwi. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna niddeskrivu sistema li tirfina mudell ta’ ġenerazzjoni naturali tal-lingwi għall-problem a tas-soluzzjoni tal-blokk tal-kittieb. L-irfinar ibiddel il-kundizzjonar biex jinkludi wkoll il-kuntest it-tajjeb minbarra l-kuntest tax-xellug, kif ukoll list a fakultattiva ta’ entitajiet, id-daqs, il-ġeneru u sommarju tal-paragrafu li l-awtur uman jixtieq jiġġenera. L-a ġġustament propost tagħna jikseb riżultati eċċellenti, anke b’għadd żgħir ta’ epoki u spiża totali ta’ USD 150. Is-sistema tista’ tiġi a ċċessata bħala servizz tal-internet u l-kodiċi kollu jiġi rilaxxat. Huwa disponibbli wkoll vidjo li juri l-interfaċċja u l-mudell.', 'pl': 'W dzisiejszych czasach standardową procedurą jest rozwiązywanie zadania ekstrakcji informacji poprzez dostosowanie dużych wstępnie przeszkolonych modeli językowych. Nie dotyczy to zadań generacyjnych, które opierają się na różnych technik kontrolowanego generowania języka. W artykule opisujemy system dostosowujący model generowania języka naturalnego do problemu rozwiązania blokady pisarskiej. Dostosowanie zmienia warunki tak, aby uwzględnić również prawy kontekst oprócz lewego kontekstu, a także opcjonalną listę podmiotów, wielkość, gatunek oraz podsumowanie akapitu, który autor ludzki chce wygenerować. Proponowane przez nas dopracowanie uzyskuje doskonałe rezultaty, nawet przy niewielkiej liczbie epok i całkowitym kosztie USD 150. Do systemu można uzyskać dostęp jako serwis internetowy i cały kod jest uwalniany. Dostępny jest również film prezentujący interfejs i model.', 'ro': 'Este o procedură standard în aceste zile pentru a rezolva sarcina de extragere a informațiilor prin reglarea fină a modelelor lingvistice mari pre-instruite. Acest lucru nu este cazul sarcinii de generare, care se bazează pe o varietate de tehnici pentru generarea controlată a limbii. În această lucrare, descriem un sistem care reglează fin un model de generare a limbajului natural pentru problema rezolvării blocului scriitorului. Reglajul fin modifică condiționarea pentru a include, de asemenea, contextul drept în plus față de contextul stâng, precum și o listă opțională de entități, dimensiunea, genul și un rezumat al paragrafului pe care autorul uman dorește să-l genereze. Ajustarea noastră fină propusă obține rezultate excelente, chiar și cu un număr mic de epoci și un cost total de 150 USD. Sistemul poate fi accesat ca un serviciu web și tot codul este eliberat. De asemenea, este disponibil un videoclip care prezintă interfața și modelul.', 'mn': 'Өнөөдөр энэ нь мэдээллийн хайлтын ажлыг шийдэх стандарт процедур юм. Энэ үеийн даалгаварын тухай биш. Энэ нь хэл төрөлхтний удирдах олон технологи дээр хамааралтай. Энэ цаасан дээр бид зохиолчдын блокуудыг шийдэх асуудлын тухай байгалийн хэлний төрөлхтний загварыг тодорхойлох системийг тайлбарлаж байна. Баруун орчинд баруун орчин мөн зүүн орчинд нэмэгдүүлэх шалтгаан нь өөрчлөгдөж байна. Баруун орчин, бүлгүүд, хэмжээ, жанр, хүний зохиолч үүсгэхийг хүссэн хэлбэрийн жагсаалт мөн нэмэгдүүлэх шаардлагатай. Бидний санал дэвшүүлэхэд сайн үр дүнг гаргаж, жижиг хэмжээний тоо, нийт үнэ нь 150 доллар. Энэ системийг веб-үйлчилгээний хувьд ашиглаж болох ба бүх кодыг чөлөөлдөг. Интерфейс болон загварыг харуулж байгаа видео ч мөн ашиглагддаг.', 'no': 'Det er standard prosedyren desse dagane for å løysa oppgåva for utpakking av informasjon ved å finna stor føretrengde språk- modeller. Dette er ikkje tilfellet for generasjonsoppgåve, som dependerer på fleire teknikk for kontrollerte språk. I denne papiret beskriver vi eit systemet som finn opprettar eit naturleg språk-genereringsmodell for problemet med å løysa brennar-blokken. Den finnstillingane endrar kondisjonen til å også inkludere høgrekonteksten i tillegg til venstre kontekst, og ei valfri liste over einingar, storleiken, sjølvsammendrag og ei samandrag av avsnittet som menneskeforfattararen ønskjer å laga. Vårt foreslått finnstilling får utrolig resultat, selv med ein liten tal epoch og eit totalt kostnad på USD 150. Systemet kan verta tilgang som netttenesta og alle kodane vert sletta. Ein video som viser grensesnittet og modellen er også tilgjengeleg.', 'so': 'Maalmahaas waa xiliga caadi ah in lagu xalliyo shaqada soo saarista macluumaadka si fiican looga baahdo tusaale ahaan afka hore oo la tababaray. Tani ma aha xaalada shaqada farshaxanka, kaas oo ku xiran qaabab kala duduwan oo ku saabsan farshaxan kala duduwan oo la ilaaliyo qarniga luuqada. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku qornaa nidaam si fiican u muuqata muuqashada afka dabiicadda ah ee dhibaatada xalliga koobka qoraalka. Xiriirka hagitaanku wuxuu beddeliyaa shuruudaha saxda ah oo ku qoran qoraalka bidixda, sidoo kale liiska xuquuqda ah, tirada, jinsiga iyo xigaanka qoraalka qofka qoraalka dadku uu doonayo inuu sameeyo. Fiiriyahayadii wanaagsanaa waxay heli karaan resultooyin wanaagsan, xataa meelo yar iyo kharashka dhamaantood 150 USD. Sida adeegga internetka laguugu isticmaali karo nidaamka oo dhan waa la furan karaa. Fiidiyowga ka muuqata Interfaca iyo modelka waxaa sidoo kale jira.', 'sv': 'Det är standardförfarande nuförtiden för att lösa informationsutvinningsuppgiften genom att finjustera stora förklädda språkmodeller. Detta är inte fallet för generationsuppgifter, som bygger på en mängd olika tekniker för kontrollerad språkgenerering. I denna uppsats beskriver vi ett system som finjusterar en naturlig språkgenerationsmodell för problemet med att lösa skrivblock. Finjusteringen förändrar konditioneringen till att även inkludera rätt kontext förutom vänster kontext, samt en valfri lista över entiteter, storlek, genre och en sammanfattning av stycket som den mänskliga författaren vill generera. Vår föreslagna finjustering ger utmärkta resultat, även med ett litet antal epoker och en total kostnad på 150 USD. Systemet kan nås som en webbtjänst och all kod släpps. En video som visar gränssnittet och modellen finns också tillgänglig.', 'si': 'මේ දවසේ මාර්ගය නික්\u200dරීයාව විස්තර කරන්න ප්\u200dරමාණය විස්තර කරන්න තොරතුරු නික්\u200dරීයාව සඳහා ලොකු ප්\u200dරධාන භා මේක නෙවෙයි ජීවිත වැඩේ වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන්, ඒක පාලනය කරපු භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණාව සඳහා විවිධ ප්\u200dරකාරය මේ පත්තරේ අපි පද්ධතියක් විවෘත කරන්නේ ලේඛකයේ බ්ලෝක් විසඳන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරම The Fine-tuning will alter the condition to the right Contexts in the add to the right Contexts, as well as an option of units, the size, the genere and a brief of the paragraf that the man composer will want to make. අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වුනා හොඳ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර පද්ධතියට වෙබ- සේවාවක් වගේම ප්\u200dරවේශ කරන්න පුළුවන් සහ සියලුම කෝඩ් නිදහස් කරලා තියෙන්න Name', 'ta': 'இந்த நாட்களில் தகவல் பிரித்தல் செயலை நன்றாக முன் பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரிகள் மூலம் தீர்மானிக்க இது இயல்பான செயல் இது உருவாக்கும் பணிக்கான நிகழ்ச்சி அல்ல, இது கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்ட மொழி உருவாக்குவதற்கு பல தொழில்நுட்பங்கள இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு அமைப்பை விவரிக்கிறோம். ஒரு இயற்கையான மொழி உருவாக்க மாதிரியில் எழுதியவரின் தீர்வு பிர மேலும் இடது சூழ்நிலைக்குப் பதிலாக சரியான சூழலை மாற்றுகிறது, மற்றும் பொருள்களின் விருப்பப்பட்ட பட்டியல், அளவு, மரத்தின் மற்றும் மனித ஆசிரியர் உருவா எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட நல்ல முடிவுகள் பெறுகிறது, ஒரு சிறிய epoch மற்றும் மொத்தமான 150 USD விலை. இணைய சேவையகத்தால் அமைப்பு அணுகலாம் மற்றும் அனைத்து குறியீடுகளும் வெளியேற்றப்படுகிறது. இடைமுகத்தை காட்டும் மற்றும் மாதிரி காட்டும் ஒரு வீடியோ கிடைக்கும்.', 'ur': 'یہ آج کے دن معلومات اخراج کا کام حل کرنے کے لئے استاندارڈ پردازشی ہے جو بہت بڑے پیش تربین زبان موڈل سے تنظیم کرتی ہے۔ یہ نسل کے کام کے لئے کیس نہیں ہے، جو کنٹرول زبان کی نسل کے لئے مختلف فناکیل پر اعتماد ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک سیسٹم کو توصیح دیتے ہیں جو ایک طبیعی زبان کی نسل موڈل کو لکھنے کے مسئلہ کے لئے حل کرنے کے لئے مطابق ہے۔ بائیں کنٹیکسٹ کے علاوہ دائیں کنٹیکسٹ میں دائیں کنٹیکسٹ بھی شامل کرنا چاہتے ہیں، اور ایک اختیار لکھ بھی، سائز، جنر اور اس پاراگراف کا سامان بھی جو انسان لکھنے کا ارادہ کرنا چاہتا ہے. ہمارے مقرر کردہ اچھے نتیجے حاصل کرتے ہیں، اچھی تعداد کے ساتھ بھی، بہت چھوٹی تعداد کے ساتھ بھی، اور عملہ قیمت USD 150 کے ساتھ بھی۔ سیسٹم کو ویب-سرویس کے طور پر پہنچا سکتا ہے اور تمام کوڈ منتشر کئے جاتے ہیں. ایک ویڈیو کہ انٹرنیفس اور موڈل بھی موجود ہے۔', 'sr': 'To je standardna procedura danas da rešimo zadatak izvlačenja informacija sa središtem velikih predobučenih jezičkih modela. Ovo nije slučaj generacije, koji se oslanja na razne tehnike za kontroliranu generaciju jezika. U ovom papiru opisujemo sistem koji dobro napravlja prirodni model generacije jezika za problem rešavanja bloka pisaca. Pomoćno podešavanje mijenja uvjete da uključuje i desni kontekst osim lijevog konteksta, kao i opcionalni spisak entiteta, veličine, genre i sažetak paragrafa koju ljudski autor želi da stvori. Naša predložena finalna prilagodba dobija odlične rezultate, čak i sa malim brojem epoka i ukupnom troškovima od 150 dolara. Sistem se može pristupiti kao web usluga i sve šifre se oslobodi. Video pokazuje interfejs i model je takođe dostupan.', 'vi': 'Thời buổi này là thủ tục tiêu chuẩn để giải quyết việc khai thác thông tin bằng cách tinh chỉnh các mô hình ngôn ngữ lớn. Điều này không đúng với nhiệm vụ hàng thế hệ, nó dựa trên rất nhiều kỹ thuật để tạo ra ngôn ngữ được kiểm soát. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi mô tả một hệ thống chỉnh s ửa một kiểu phát ngôn ngữ tự nhiên cho vấn đề giải quyết sự cản trở tác giả. The fine-tinh chỉnh thay đổi điều hòa cũng để bao gồm cả ngữ cảnh bên trái, cũng như một danh sách tùy chọn các thực thể, kích thước, thể loại và một bản tóm tắt của đoạn mà tác giả người muốn tạo ra. Chúng tôi đã đề nghị kết quả hoàn hảo, cho dù với một số lượng nhỏ niên đại và một giá tổng hợp của USD 150. Hệ thống có thể được truy cập như một dịch vụ mạng và tất cả các mã được phát hành. Một đoạn video hiển thị giao diện và mô hình cũng có sẵn.', 'uz': "Bu kunda maʼlumotni ajratish vazifasini bir necha o'rganishdan oldin tillar modellari bilan ishlash uchun andoza vazifa. Name Bu qogʻozda, biz yozuvchi kvartallarni solash muammolari uchun asl tilning yaratish modelini yaxshi ko'rinamiz. @ info: whatsthis Bizning yaxshi suhbat natijalarimiz yaxshi natijaga ega bo'ladi. Ko'pchilik ko'pchilik va faqat 150 dollar davomida. Name Interfeys koʻrsatiladigan video va model ҳам мавжуд.", 'bg': 'Стандартна процедура е в наши дни да се реши задачата за извличане на информация чрез фина настройка на големи предварително обучени езикови модели. Това не е случаят със задачата за генериране, която разчита на различни техники за контролирано генериране на език. В тази статия описваме система, която фино настройва модела на генериране на естествен език за проблема с решаването на писателски блок. Фината настройка променя условията, за да включва и десния контекст в допълнение към левия контекст, както и незадължителен списък на обекти, размера, жанра и резюме на абзаца, който човешкият автор желае да генерира. Нашето предложение за фина настройка постига отлични резултати, дори и при малък брой епохи и обща цена от 150 щатски долара. Системата може да бъде достъпна като уеб услуга и целият код се освобождава. На разположение е и видео, показващо интерфейса и модела.', 'nl': "Het is tegenwoordig standaard procedure om informatie extractie taak op te lossen door het finetunen van grote vooraf getrainde taalmodellen. Dit is niet het geval voor generatietaken, die afhankelijk zijn van een verscheidenheid aan technieken voor gecontroleerde taalgeneratie. In dit artikel beschrijven we een systeem dat een natuurlijk taalgeneratiemodel verfijnt voor het probleem van het oplossen van writer's block. De fine-tuning verandert de conditionering om naast de linker context ook de juiste context te omvatten, evenals een optionele lijst met entiteiten, de grootte, het genre en een samenvatting van de alinea die de menselijke auteur wil genereren. Onze voorgestelde fine-tuning levert uitstekende resultaten op, zelfs met een klein aantal tijdperken en een totale kosten van USD 150. Het systeem is toegankelijk als een webservice en alle code wordt vrijgegeven. Een video met de interface en het model is ook beschikbaar.", 'da': 'Det er standard procedure i disse dage at løse Information Extraction opgave ved at finjustere store prætrænede sprogmodeller. Dette er ikke tilfældet med generationsopgaver, som er afhængig af en række teknikker til kontrolleret sproggenerering. I denne artikel beskriver vi et system, der finjusterer en naturlig sproggenerationsmodel for problemet med at løse forfatterblok. Finjusteringen ændrer konditioneringen til også at inkludere den højre kontekst ud over den venstre kontekst, samt en valgfri liste over enheder, størrelse, genre og et resumé af det afsnit, som den menneskelige forfatter ønsker at generere. Vores foreslåede finjustering opnår fremragende resultater, selv med et lille antal epoker og en samlet pris på USD 150. Systemet kan tilgås som en web-service og al koden frigives. En video, der viser grænsefladen og modellen, er også tilgængelig.', 'de': 'Es ist heutzutage Standard, Informationsextraktionsaufgaben durch Feinabstimmung großer vortrainierter Sprachmodelle zu lösen. Dies ist nicht der Fall bei der Generierungsaufgabe, die auf einer Vielzahl von Techniken zur kontrollierten Sprachgenerierung beruht. In diesem Beitrag beschreiben wir ein System, das ein natürliches Sprachgenerierungsmodell für das Problem der Lösung des Schreibblocks feinabstimmt. Die Feinabstimmung ändert die Konditionierung, um neben dem linken Kontext auch den rechten Kontext sowie eine optionale Liste der Entitäten, die Größe, das Genre und eine Zusammenfassung des Absatzes, den der menschliche Autor generieren möchte, einzubeziehen. Unsere vorgeschlagene Feinabstimmung erzielt hervorragende Ergebnisse, auch bei einer kleinen Anzahl von Epochen und einem Gesamtpreis von USD 150. Das System kann als Webservice aufgerufen werden und der gesamte Code wird freigegeben. Ein Video, das die Schnittstelle und das Modell zeigt, ist ebenfalls verfügbar.', 'hr': 'To je standardna postupak za rješavanje zadatka izvlačenja informacija ovih dana, prilagođenim velikim predobučenim jezičkim modelima. To nije slučaj generacije, koji se oslanja na razne tehnike za kontroliranu generaciju jezika. U ovom papiru opisujemo sistem koji dobro navodi prirodni model generacije jezika za problem rješavanja bloka pisaca. Pomoćno određivanje mijenja uvjete uključujući i desni kontekst osim lijevog konteksta, kao i opcionalni popis entiteta, veličine, genre i sažetak odstavka kojeg čovjek autor želi stvoriti. Naša predložena finalna prilagodba dobiva odlične rezultate, čak i sa malim brojem epoka i ukupnom troškovima 150 dolara. Sistem se može pristupiti kao web usluga i sve šifre se oslobodi. Video pokazuje interfejs i model je također dostupan.', 'id': 'Ini adalah prosedur standar hari ini untuk memecahkan tugas Informasi Ekstraksi dengan memperbaiki model bahasa besar pra-dilatih. Ini bukan kasus untuk tugas generasi, yang bergantung pada berbagai teknik untuk generasi bahasa terkendali. Dalam kertas ini, kami menggambarkan sistem yang menyesuaikan model generasi bahasa alami untuk masalah penyelesaian blok penulis. Penyesuaian mengubah kondisi untuk juga termasuk konteks kanan selain konteks kiri, serta daftar pilihan entitas, ukuran, genre dan ringkasan dari paragraf yang penulis manusia ingin menghasilkan. Our proposed fine-tuning obtains excellent results, even with a small number of epochs and a total cost of USD 150.  Sistem dapat diakses sebagai layanan web dan semua kode dibebaskan. Video yang menunjukkan antarmuka dan model juga tersedia.', 'sw': 'Ni utaratibu wa kawaida wa siku hizi wa kutatua kazi ya Utoa wa Habari kwa kutumia mifano makubwa ya lugha zilizofunzwa kabla. Hii si suala la kazi za kizazi, linategemea mbinu mbalimbali za kizazi kinachodhibitiwa kwa lugha. Katika karatasi hii, tunaelezea mfumo unaotumia vizuri wa kizazi cha lugha asili kwa tatizo la kutatua kizuizi cha mwandishi. Mabadiliko mazuri yanabadilisha hali ya mazingira ya kulia pia yanajumuisha muktadha wa kulia zaidi ya muktadha wa kushoto, pamoja na orodha ya chaguo la vitu, ukubwa, jeni na muhtasari wa msingi ambalo mwandishi wa binadamu anataka kutengeneza. Tulipendekezwa kupendekeza vizuri hupata matokeo mazuri, hata kwa kiasi kidogo cha epochi na gharama za jumla ya dola za Marekani 150. Mfumo unaweza kupatikana kama huduma ya mtandaoni na sheria zote zimetolewa. Video inayoonyesha sura hiyo na modeli pia inapatikana.', 'ko': '오늘날 미리 훈련된 대형 언어 모델을 미세하게 조정하여 정보 추출 임무를 해결하는 것은 이미 표준 프로그램이 되었다.임무를 생성하는 것은 그렇지 않다. 각종 기술에 의존해 통제 언어를 생성한다.본고에서 우리는 하나의 시스템을 묘사했는데 이 시스템은 자연 언어 생성 모델을 미세하게 조정하여 블록을 쓰는 문제를 해결할 수 있다.미조는 조건을 바꾸었다. 왼쪽 언어 환경을 제외하고 오른쪽 언어 환경과 인류 작가가 생성하고자 하는 실체, 크기, 장르와 단락 요약의 선택 가능한 목록을 포함한다.우리가 제시한 마이크로스피드 방안은 소량의 시간이 필요하더라도 총 원가가 150달러라는 좋은 효과를 거두었다.이 시스템은 웹 서비스로 접근할 수 있으며 모든 코드가 발표되었다.인터페이스와 모형을 보여주는 영상도 제공했다.', 'tr': 'Bu günlerde Maglumat Açmak zadyny gowy bilim sistemasynda çözmek üçin standart prosedür. Bu generasiýa görevleri üçin däl däl. Bu dürli dil döredişi üçin beýleki tekniklere ynanýar. Bu kagyzda, ýazçylaryň bloklaryny çözmek üçin tebigat dil döredijilerini bejeren sistemany tassykladyrys. Ýagtylamak isleýän şartlary sol kontekste üýtgetmek üçin sag konteksti we saýlamak üçin üýtgedýär. Biziň teklipimiz edilen iň gowy netijelerimiz bar, hatda kiçi bir sany epoch we jemi bedeli dollar 150 dolar. Bu sistemi web häsiýeti ýaly girişip biler we ähli kody çykarylýar. Bir wideo arayüzü we model da mevcut.', 'fa': 'این روزها کار استاندارد برای حل کار خارج کردن اطلاعات با تنظیم مدل های پیش آموزش بزرگ است. این پرونده برای وظیفه نسل نیست که بر خلاف تکنیک های مختلف برای نسل زبان کنترل بستگی دارد. در این کاغذ، ما سیستم را توصیف می\u200cکنیم که یک مدل نسل زبان طبیعی را برای مشکل حل بلوک نویسنده\u200cها به طور کامل تنظیم می\u200cکند. تنظیم\u200cکننده\u200cی پاکیزه شرایط را تغییر می\u200cدهد تا همچنین محیط راست را در اضافه به محیط چپ شامل کند، همچنین یک فهرست گزینه\u200cای از شرایط، اندازه، ژن و جمعیت پاراگرافی که نویسنده انسان می\u200cخواهد تولید کند. پيشنهاد داده شده\u200cايم نتايج فوق العاده\u200cاي پيدا مي\u200cكنيم، حتي با تعداد کوچيک اپوچ و هزينه\u200cي کامل 150 دلار آمريکا. سیستم می\u200cتواند به عنوان خدمت وب دسترسی شود و تمام کد آزاد شود. یک ویدئو نشان دادن interface ی و مدل هم موجود است.', 'af': "Dit is standaard prosedure hierdie dae om inligting uitpak taak te los deur fyn- tuning van groot voor- opgelei taal modele. Hierdie is nie die geval vir generasie taak nie, wat op 'n verskillende tekniks aflyk vir beheer taal generasie. In hierdie papier, beskrywe ons 'n stelsel wat 'n natuurlike taal geneeringsmodel vir die probleem van die oplossing van skrywer se blok. Die fyn- tuning verander die voorwaarding om ook die regter konteks in byvoeg na die linker konteks te insluit, as ook 'n opsionele lys van entiteite, die grootte, die genre en 'n opsomming van die paragraaf wat die menslike outeur wil genereer. Ons voorgestelde fin-tuning kry uitgelukkige resultate, selfs met 'n klein aantal epochs en 'n totaal koste van USD 150. Die stelsel kan toegang word as 'n web- diens en al die kode is verlos. 'n Videowys die koppelvlak en die model is ook beskikbaar.", 'sq': 'Është procedura standard këto ditë për të zgjidhur detyrën e nxjerrjes së informacionit duke rregulluar modelet e mëdha të gjuhës së stërvitur para. This is not the case for generation task, which relies on a variety of techniques for controlled language generation.  Në këtë letër, ne përshkruajmë një sistem që përshtat një model të gjenerimit natyror të gjuhës për problemin e zgjidhjes s ë bllokut të shkrimtarit. Përcaktimi ndryshon kushtëzimin për të përfshirë gjithashtu kontekstin e djathtë përveç kontekstit të majtë, si dhe një list ë opsionale të njësive, madhësinë, xhenerin dhe një përmbledhje të paragramës që autori njerëzor dëshiron të gjenerojë. Përrregullimi ynë i propozuar fiton rezultate të shkëlqyera, edhe me një numër të vogël epokësh dhe një kosto totale prej 150 USD. Sistemi mund të hyjë si një shërbim web dhe të gjithë kodi është lëshuar. Një video që tregon interfaqen dhe modelin është gjithashtu në dispozicion.', 'hy': 'Այսօրվա ստանդարտ գործընթացն է լուծելու տեղեկատվության արտահանման խնդիրը բարելավելով նախապատրաստված լեզվի մեծ մոդելները: Սա սերնդի խնդիր չէ, որը հիմնված է լեզվի կառավարման տարբեր տեխնիկաների վրա: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նկարագրում ենք մի համակարգ, որը բարելավում է բնական լեզվի ստեղծման մոդելը գրողի բլոկի լուծման խնդրի համար: Այն փոփոխում է պայմանադրությունը, որպեսզի ներառի նաև աջ կոնտեքստը ձախ կոնտեքստից բացի, ինչպես նաև անհրաժեշտ կազմակերպությունների ցուցակ, չափ, գենդեր և պարբերակի համառոտագրություն, որը մարդու հեղինակը ցանկանում է ստեղծել: Մեր առաջարկած բարելավումը հսկայական արդյունքներ է ստանում նույնիսկ մի փոքր ժամանակաշրջաններով և 150 դոլար համաշխարհային արժեքը: Համակարգը կարելի է հասնել որպես վեբ-ծառայություն, և բոլոր կոդները ազատվում են: Տեսագրություն, որը ցույց է տալիս ինտերֆեյսը և մոդելը նաև հասանելի է:', 'am': 'አዲስ የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎችን በመጠቀም የመረጃ ማውጣት ስራዎችን ለመፈጸም ቀኑ የድጋፍ ሥርዓት ነው፡፡ ይህ ለትውልድ ስራ አይደለም፣ በተለየ ቋንቋ ትውልድ ላይ በተለያዩ ስልጣናዎች የሚታመን ነው፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ የጻፊውን ደብዳቤ መቆጣጠር የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ትውልድ ምሳሌ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ አቀማመጥ አካባቢ፣ አካባቢ እና አካባቢዎች፣ መጠን፣ በሙሉ እና ማጠቃለያው የጽሑፍ አካባቢ እንዲያስተካክሉ የቀኝ ሥርዓት ማሰናከል እንዲያስተካክሉ ነው፡፡ በጥቂት ኢፍኮች እና በሙሉ የአሜሪካ 150 የአሜሪካ ዋጋ ጥሩ ፍሬዎችን አግኝቷል፡፡ ሲስተም እንደ መረብ-ማገልገል ይችላል፣ ኮዱንም ሁሉ ይፈታል። የፊቱን እና ሞዴል የሚያሳየው ቪዲዮ ደግሞ ተገኝቶአል።', 'bn': 'এই দিনে তথ্য এক্সট্র্যাক্ট্র্যাকশন কাজ সমাধান করার জন্য এটা স্থানীয় প্রক্রিয়া। প্রজন্মের কাজের জন্য এই কেস নয়, যা নিয়ন্ত্রণিত ভাষা প্রজন্মের জন্য নিয়ন্ত্রণের বিভিন্ন ধরনের কৌশল নির্ভর কর এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি সিস্টেম বর্ণনা করি যে লেখকের ব্লক সমাধানের সমস্যার জন্য প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রজন্মের মডেলের সুন্দর বাঁদিকের প্রেক্ষাপট ছাড়াও ডান প্রেক্ষাপটের পরিসংখ্যান পরিবর্তন করা হয়েছে, যার মধ্যে মানুষের লেখক তৈরি করতে চায় সেই প্যাক্টারের তালিকাও, আকার,  আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত ভালোভাবে প্রাপ্ত ফলাফল পেয়েছে, এমনকি কয়েকটা ইপোক এবং ১৫০ মার্কিন ডলারের মূল্য। ওয়েব সার্ভিস হিসেবে সিস্টেম প্রবেশ করা যাবে এবং সকল কোড মুক্তি পাবে। ইন্টারফেস দেখানোর একটি ভিডিও এবং মডেল পাওয়া যাচ্ছে।', 'bs': 'To je standardna procedura za rješavanje zadataka izvlačenja informacija ovih dana, prilagođenim velikim predobučenim jezičkim modelima. Ovo nije slučaj generacije, koji se oslanja na razne tehnike za kontroliranu generaciju jezika. U ovom papiru opisujemo sistem koji dobro navodi model prirodnog jezika za problem rješavanja bloka pisaca. Pomoćno podešavanje mijenja uvjete da uključuje i desni kontekst osim lijevog konteksta, kao i opcionalni spisak entiteta, veličine, genre i sažetak paragrafa koji ljudski autor želi stvoriti. Naša predložena finalna prilagodba dobija odlične rezultate, čak i sa malim brojem epoka i ukupnom troškovima od 150 dolara. Sistem se može pristupiti kao web usluga i sve kodiranje je objavljeno. Video pokazuje interfejs i model je takođe dostupan.', 'az': 'Bu günlərdə büyük öyrənmiş dil modelləri ilə məlumatları çəkmək üçün standart prosedür. Bu nəsil işləri üçün məsəl deyildir. Bu, kontrol edilmiş dil nəsillərinin müxtəlif tekniklərə təvəkkül edir. Bu kağızda, yazıcının bloğunu çəkmə problemi üçün təbiətli dil nəslinin modelini təmizləyən bir sistemi təmizləyirik. Sənin yazıcının yaratmaq istədiyi paragrafının böyüklüyü, böyüklüyü, cütlüyü və sağ məlumatı də sağ məlumatı daxil etmək üçün müəyyən edilən tərzi dəyişdirir. Bizim təklif etdiyimiz yaxşı sonuçlarımız var, hətta küçük bir sayı epoch və bütün maliyyətimiz USD 150. Sistem web servisi kimi istifadə edilə bilər və bütün kodlar yayınlanar. İnterfəçisini və modelini də göstərən bir video var.', 'ca': "És un procediment normal avui en dia per resoldre la tasca d'Extracció d'Informació ajustando grans models de llenguatge pré-entrenats. Això no és el cas per a la tasca de generació, que es basa en una varietat de tècniques per a la generació controlada de llengües. En aquest article, descrivim un sistema que ajusta un model natural de generació de llenguatges per al problem a de resoldre el bloc d'escriptors. L'ajustament canvia la condicionació per incloure també el context dret a més del context esquerre, i una llista opcional d'entitats, la mida, el gènere i un resum del paràgraf que l'autor humà vol generar. El nostre ajustament proposat obté excels resultats, fins i tot amb un petit nombre d'èpoces i un cost total de 150 dòlars. El sistema es pot accedir com a servei web i tot el codi s'allibera. A video showcasing the interface and the model is also available.", 'cs': 'V dnešní době je standardním postupem řešit úlohu extrakce informací jemným laděním velkých předškolených jazykových modelů. To není případ generačního úkolu, který spoléhá na různé techniky řízeného generování jazyka. V tomto článku popisujeme systém, který jemně ladí model generace přirozeného jazyka pro problém řešení spisovatelského bloku. Jemné ladění mění podmínky tak, aby kromě levého kontextu zahrnovalo i pravý kontext, stejně jako volitelný seznam entit, velikost, žánr a souhrn odstavce, který si lidský autor přeje generovat. Naše navržené jemné ladění dosahuje vynikajících výsledků i s malým počtem epoch a celkovými náklady USD 150. Systém je přístupný jako webová služba a veškerý kód je uvolněn. K dispozici je také video představující rozhraní a model.', 'et': 'Tänapäeval on standardne protseduur lahendada teabe ekstraheerimise ülesanne suurte eelõpetatud keelemudelite täpsustamisega. See ei kehti generatsiooni ülesande puhul, mis tugineb mitmesugustele kontrollitud keele genereerimise meetoditele. Käesolevas töös kirjeldame süsteemi, mis täpsustab looduskeele genereerimise mudelit kirjanikubloki lahendamise probleemiks. Peenhäälestamine muudab tingimust lisaks vasakule kontekstile ka parema konteksti, samuti valikulise olemite nimekirja, suuruse, žanri ja lõigu kokkuvõtte, mida inimautor soovib genereerida. Meie pakutud peenhäälestus annab suurepäraseid tulemusi isegi väikese arvu epohhide ja kogumaksumusega 150 USA dollarit. Süsteemile pääseb ligi veebiteenusena ja kogu kood vabastatakse. Saadaval on ka video, mis näitab liidest ja mudelit.', 'fi': 'Nykyään on vakiokäytäntö ratkaista tiedonhankintatehtävä hienosäätämällä suuria esikoulutettuja kielimalleja. Tämä ei koske sukupolvitehtävää, joka perustuu erilaisiin tekniikoihin kontrolloidun kielen tuottamiseksi. Tässä artikkelissa kuvailemme järjestelmää, joka hienosäätää luonnollisen kielen generointimallia kirjoittajan lohkon ratkaisemiseen. Hienosäätö muuttaa ehdollisuutta siten, että se sisältää vasemman kontekstin lisäksi myös oikean kontekstin sekä valinnaisen luettelon entiteeteistä, koon, genren ja tiivistelmän kappaleesta, jonka ihminen haluaa luoda. Ehdotettu hienosäätömme tuottaa erinomaisia tuloksia, vaikka kyseessä olisi pieni määrä aikakausia ja kokonaiskustannukset olisivat 150 dollaria. Järjestelmään pääsee verkkopalveluna ja kaikki koodi julkaistaan. Saatavilla on myös video, jossa esitellään käyttöliittymä ja malli.', 'jv': 'singular Iki gak bener kanggo kelompok nggawe juter sampeyan, sing mau ngewehke sak teknik karo perusahaan bangsa wis nguasar. Nang mapun iki, kéné rambarang sistem sing paling nggawe gerangkat luwih apik banget nggawe perbudhakan kanggo nggawe blocking batir. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem dibutur-sistem sing luwih barang gampang, lho ngono nganggo sistem sing ngawe barang epok lan akeh barang kotak limang dolar duwih dolar ping limang dolar Sistem iso diandeses pengguna web lan kabèh sing kode mbukak. Video Jejaring mbukake arah lan model kuwi wis ana.', 'sk': 'Danes je standardni postopek reševanja naloge pridobivanja informacij z natančnim nastavitvijo velikih vnaprej usposobljenih jezikovnih modelov. To ne velja za nalogo generacije, ki temelji na različnih tehnikah za nadzorovano generiranje jezika. V prispevku opisujemo sistem, ki natančno nastavi model generiranja naravnega jezika za problem reševanja pisateljevega bloka. Fino nastavitev spreminja pogoje tako, da poleg levega vključuje tudi desni kontekst, kot tudi neobvezen seznam entitet, velikost, žanr in povzetek odstavka, ki ga želi človeški avtor ustvariti. Naše predlagano fino uravnavanje dosega odlične rezultate, tudi z majhnim številom epoh in skupnim stroškom 150 USD. Sistem je dostopen kot spletna storitev in vsa koda se izda. Na voljo je tudi video, ki prikazuje vmesnik in model.', 'ha': "@ action: button Wannan bai zama al'amarin wa aikin kizazi, wanda ke dõgara a kan wasu masu shiryoyin ayuka na danne-zaɓen harshe. In this paper, we describe a system that fine-tunes a natural language generation model for the problem of solving writer's block.  Tsarawa na gyare-gyare yana canza halin da za'a shigar da mazaɓa na dama, da kuma wani jerin abubuwa na daidaita, girmar, jeni da ƙarami na rubutun mutum yana son ya ƙãga. Kayya da musamman kyakko na sami matsayi mai kyau, kuma kõ da ƙarami kaɗan na applo da cikakken $150. Ana iya iya samun shirin ayuka kamar wata shirin web kuma an saka koden duk. Wani video ya nuna fuskar kwamfyuta da shirin ayuka yana da amfani.", 'bo': 'འདི་ནི་དུས་ཀྱི་ཆེད་དུ་ཆ་འཕྲིན་སྐྱེལ་ལས་ཀ་ཆོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་བྱེད་ནི་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཡོད། འདི་ནི་མི་རབས་པའི་ལས་འགུལ་ལ་རྗེས་སུ་མེད་པར། སྐད་རིགས་ལ་ཚད་འཛིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཤིག་དང་། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ལྟ་བུའི་མ་ལག་ཅིག་བྲིས་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་མ་ལག་ཅིག་གཟུགས་འབྲི་མིག་གི་གྲོང་གླིང་སྒྲིག The fine-tuning changes the conditioning to also include the right context in addition to the left context, as well as an optional list of entities, the size, the genre and a summary of the paragraph that the human author wants to generate. ང་ཚོའི་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་དྲན་སྐུལ་གྱིས་བཏོན་པ་ཞིག་ཡོད་ཚད་རྩ་བའི་འབྲས་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད། མ་ལག་འདི་དྲ་བ་ཞབས་ཞུ་ཞིག་དང་གསང་གྲངས་ཡོངས་རྫོགས་ལ་འདྲི་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ སྒྲ་བརྙན་ཞིག་བྱས་ནས་མཐུད་སྣེ་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་པའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་འདུག', 'he': "זה תהליך סטנדרטי בימים אלה לפתור משימה מידע מחלץ על ידי התאים גדול דוגמנים לשפה מאומנים מראש. זה לא המקרה למשימה של דור, שסומכת על מגוון של טכניקות לדור שפות שולטת. In this paper, we describe a system that fine-tunes a natural language generation model for the problem of solving writer's block.  התאים משנה את התאים כדי לכלול גם את הקשר הנכון בנוסף לקשר השמאלי, כמו גם רשימה אופציונלית של יחידות, הגודל, הסגנור והסכם של הפרק שהסופר האנושי רוצה ליצור. התרגיל המוצע שלנו מקבל תוצאות מצוינות, אפילו עם מספר קטן של תקופות ועלות בסך הכל של 150 דולר. יש גישה למערכת כשירות רשת וכל הקוד משוחרר. A video showcasing the interface and the model is also available."}
{'en': 'Domain Expert Platform for Goal-Oriented Dialog Collection', 'ar': 'منصة خبراء المجال لمجموعة الحوار الموجهة نحو الهدف', 'es': 'Plataforma de expertos en dominios para la recopilación de diálogos orientados a objetivos', 'pt': 'Plataforma de especialistas de domínio para coleta de diálogos orientada a metas', 'fr': 'Plate-forme Domain Expert pour la collecte de boîtes de dialogue orientées objectifs', 'ja': '目標指向のダイアログコレクションのためのドメインエキスパートプラットフォーム', 'zh': '向的对话集领地专家平台', 'hi': 'लक्ष्य-उन्मुख संवाद संग्रह के लिए डोमेन विशेषज्ञ प्लेटफ़ॉर्म', 'ru': 'Экспертная платформа домена для коллекции диалоговых окон, ориентированных на достижение целей', 'ga': 'Ardán Saineolach Fearainn le haghaidh Bailiú Dialóige Dírithe ar Sprioc', 'ka': 'დიალოგის კოლექციისთვის დომენის ექსპერტის პლატორმა', 'el': 'Πλατφόρμα εμπειρογνωμόνων τομέα για τη συλλογή διαλόγων προσανατολισμένων στον στόχο', 'hu': 'Tartományi szakértői platform a célorientált párbeszédgyűjteményhez', 'it': 'Piattaforma di esperti del dominio per la raccolta di finestre orientate agli obiettivi', 'ms': 'Platform Ekspert Domain untuk Koleksi Dialog Berorientasi-Tujuan', 'lt': 'Su tikslais susijusių dialogų rinkimo srities ekspertų platforma', 'mk': 'Платформа за експерти од домен за собирање дијалози ориентирани на цели', 'ml': 'ഗോള്\u200d- oriented ഡയലോഗ് സംഘടിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഡൊമെന്\u200d പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോം', 'mt': 'Pjattaforma ta’ Esperti Domeniċi għall-Ġbir ta’ Djalogu Orientat lejn l-Għanijiet', 'pl': 'Platforma ekspertów domeny dla zbierania dialogów zorientowanych na cel', 'ro': 'Platformă expertă în domenii pentru colecția de dialog orientată spre obiective', 'sr': 'Platforma eksperta domena za kolekciju ciljeva orijentiranog dijaloga', 'si': 'ලක්ෂණ- ප්\u200dරමාණය සංවාදය සම්බන්ධය සඳහා ඩෝමේන් විශේෂ ප්ලේටෆෝම්', 'so': 'Platform for Goal-oriented Dialog collection', 'sv': 'Domänexpertplattform för målinriktad dialogsamling', 'mn': 'Гол ориентиролтын диалог цуглуулалтын салбарын эксперт платформ', 'no': 'Domeneekspertplattform for samling med målsorientert dialogvindauge', 'ta': 'செல்லுபடியாக்கப்பட்ட உரையாடல் தொகுப்புக்கான டொமைன் ஏற்றுமதி தளம்', 'kk': 'Мақсатты диалогты жинақтау үшін домен эксперттер платформасы', 'ur': 'ڈومین اکسپرٹ پلٹورم گل-اوریٹ ڈیلوگ کالکتر کے لئے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Võ đài chuyên môn miền cho bộ sưu tập thoại về mục tiêu', 'hr': 'Platforma stručnjaka domena za kolekciju ciljeva orijentiranog dijaloga', 'nl': 'Domeinexpertplatform voor doelgerichte dialoogverzameling', 'da': 'Domæneekspertplatform til målorienteret dialogsamling', 'bg': 'Експертна платформа за домейн за целенасочена диалогова колекция', 'id': 'Platform Ekspert Domain untuk Koleksi Dialog Orientasi-Tujuan', 'fa': 'Platform Expert Domain for Target-Oriented Dialog Collection', 'de': 'Domain Expert Platform für zielorientierte Dialogsammlung', 'ko': '목표를 위한 대화 수집 분야 전문가 플랫폼', 'sw': 'Jukwaa la Wataalam wa Domain kwa Mkusanyiko wa Dialog', 'tr': 'Görniş Opşenler Dälogyň ýygnamasy üçin sahypa Eksempli Platform', 'af': 'Domein Eksperte Platform vir Goal- Orienteerde Dialoog Versameling', 'sq': 'Platforma e Ekspertëve të Domenit për mbledhjen e dialogut me qëllim', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'hy': 'Առաջնական հաղորդակցման մասնագետ պլատֆորմ', 'bn': 'গন্তব্য ডায়ালগ সংগ্রহের জন্য ডোমেন এক্সপ্ল্যাটফর্ম', 'az': 'Gözəl-Orientli Dialoog Kolleksiyası üçün Domena Ekspert Platformu', 'bs': 'Platforma eksperta domena za kolekciju ciljeva orijentiranog dijaloga', 'cs': 'Doménová expertní platforma pro sběr dialogů orientovaných na cíl', 'et': 'Domeeni ekspertide platvorm eesmärkidele orienteeritud dialoogide kogumiseks', 'fi': 'Domain Expert Platform for Goal-Oriented Dialog Collection', 'ca': "Plataforma d'experts de domini per a la col·lecció de diàlegs orientats als objectius", 'jv': 'domain Awart Plaformat for Goal-Oriented Dialog Gallery', 'sk': 'Področna strokovna platforma za zbirko pogovornih oknov, usmerjenih v cilje', 'ha': 'Domain Expert Platform for Goal-Oriented Dialog Collection', 'he': 'Domain Expert Platform for Goal-Oriented Dialog Collection', 'bo': 'གཙོ་སླུང་ཕྱོགས་ཡོད་པའི་ཌའི་ལོག་མཛོད་ཁང་གི་ཆེད་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་Platform'}
{'en': 'Today, most dialogue systems are fully or partly built using neural network architectures. A crucial prerequisite for the creation of a goal-oriented neural network dialogue system is a dataset that represents typical dialogue scenarios and includes various semantic annotations, e.g. intents, slots and dialogue actions, that are necessary for training a particular neural network architecture. In this demonstration paper, we present an easy to use interface and its back-end which is oriented to domain experts for the collection of goal-oriented dialogue samples. The platform not only allows to collect or write sample dialogues in a structured way, but also provides a means for simple annotation and interpretation of the dialogues. The platform itself is language-independent ; it depends only on the availability of particular language processing components for a specific language. It is currently being used to collect dialogue samples in Latvian (a highly inflected language) which represent typical communication between students and the student service.', 'fr': "Aujourd'hui, la plupart des systèmes de dialogue sont entièrement ou partiellement construits à partir d'architectures de réseaux neuronaux. Une condition préalable essentielle à la création d'un système de dialogue de réseau neuronal orienté vers un objectif est un ensemble de données qui représente des scénarios de dialogue typiques et inclut diverses annotations sémantiques, par exemple des intentions, des créneaux et des actions de dialogue, nécessaires à l'entraînement d'une architecture de réseau neuronal particulière. Dans ce document de démonstration, nous présentons une interface facile à utiliser et son back-end qui est destiné aux experts du domaine pour la collecte d'échantillons de dialogue orientés vers des objectifs. La plateforme permet non seulement de collecter ou d'écrire des exemples de dialogues de manière structurée, mais fournit également un moyen d'annotation et d'interprétation simples des dialogues. La plateforme elle-même est indépendante de la langue\xa0; elle dépend uniquement de la disponibilité de composants de traitement linguistique particuliers pour une langue spécifique. Il est actuellement utilisé pour collecter des échantillons de dialogue en letton (une langue très fléchie) qui représentent une communication typique entre les étudiants et le service étudiant.", 'es': 'Hoy en día, la mayoría de los sistemas de diálogo se construyen total o parcialmente utilizando arquitecturas de redes neuronales. Un requisito previo crucial para la creación de un sistema de diálogo de redes neuronales orientado a objetivos es un conjunto de datos que represente escenarios de diálogo típicos e incluya varias anotaciones semánticas, por ejemplo, intenciones, espacios y acciones de diálogo, que son necesarias para entrenar una arquitectura de red neuronal particular. En este documento de demostración, presentamos una interfaz fácil de usar y su back-end que está orientada a expertos en el dominio para la recopilación de muestras de diálogo orientadas a objetivos. La plataforma no solo permite recopilar o escribir diálogos de muestra de forma estructurada, sino que también proporciona un medio para realizar anotaciones e interpretaciones simples de los diálogos. La plataforma en sí es independiente del idioma; solo depende de la disponibilidad de componentes de procesamiento de idiomas particulares para un idioma específico. Actualmente se utiliza para recopilar muestras de diálogos en letón (un idioma altamente flexionado) que representan la comunicación típica entre los estudiantes y el servicio estudiantil.', 'ar': 'اليوم ، معظم أنظمة الحوار مبنية كليًا أو جزئيًا باستخدام معماريات الشبكة العصبية. من المتطلبات الأساسية لإنشاء نظام حوار شبكة عصبية موجه نحو الهدف هو مجموعة البيانات التي تمثل سيناريوهات حوار نموذجية وتتضمن العديد من التعليقات التوضيحية الدلالية ، على سبيل المثال النوايا والفتحات وإجراءات الحوار الضرورية لتدريب بنية شبكة عصبية معينة. في ورقة العرض هذه ، نقدم واجهة سهلة الاستخدام ونهايتها الخلفية الموجهة لخبراء المجال لتجميع عينات الحوار الموجه نحو الهدف. لا يسمح النظام الأساسي بجمع أو كتابة نماذج الحوارات بطريقة منظمة فحسب ، بل يوفر أيضًا وسيلة للتعليق التوضيحي البسيط وتفسير الحوارات. النظام الأساسي نفسه مستقل عن اللغة ؛ يعتمد ذلك فقط على توفر مكونات معالجة لغة معينة للغة معينة. يتم استخدامه حاليًا لجمع عينات من الحوار باللغة اللاتفية (لغة شديدة التأثر) والتي تمثل اتصالًا نموذجيًا بين الطلاب وخدمة الطلاب.', 'pt': 'Hoje, a maioria dos sistemas de diálogo é total ou parcialmente construída usando arquiteturas de redes neurais. Um pré-requisito crucial para a criação de um sistema de diálogo de rede neural orientado a objetivos é um conjunto de dados que represente cenários de diálogo típicos e inclua várias anotações semânticas, por exemplo, intents, slots e ações de diálogo, que são necessários para treinar uma arquitetura de rede neural particular. Neste documento de demonstração, apresentamos uma interface fácil de usar e seu back-end que é orientado a especialistas do domínio para a coleta de amostras de diálogo orientadas a objetivos. A plataforma não só permite coletar ou escrever diálogos de amostra de forma estruturada, mas também fornece um meio para simples anotação e interpretação dos diálogos. A plataforma em si é independente do idioma; depende apenas da disponibilidade de componentes de processamento de linguagem específicos para um idioma específico. Atualmente, está sendo usado para coletar amostras de diálogo em letão (uma língua altamente flexionada) que representam a comunicação típica entre os alunos e o serviço estudantil.', 'ja': '今日、ほとんどの対話システムは、ニューラルネットワークアーキテクチャを使用して完全にまたは部分的に構築されています。 目標指向のニューラルネットワーク対話システムを作成するための重要な前提条件は、典型的な対話シナリオを表し、特定のニューラルネットワークアーキテクチャを訓練するために必要な様々な意味論的注釈、例えば、インテント、スロット、および対話アクションを含むデータセットである。 このデモ論文では、目標指向の対話サンプルの収集のためのドメイン専門家向けの使いやすいインターフェースとそのバックエンドを紹介します。 このプラットフォームは、構造化された方法でサンプルのダイアログを収集または書き込むことを可能にするだけでなく、ダイアログの単純な注釈と解釈のための手段を提供します。 プラットフォーム自体は言語に依存しません。特定の言語の特定の言語処理コンポーネントの可用性にのみ依存します。 現在、学生と学生サービスの間の典型的なコミュニケーションを表すラトビア語（非常に屈折した言語）の対話サンプルを収集するために使用されています。', 'zh': '今多以神经网络架构为言者。 创向之神经网络,言统之要,所以示典对之数据集,兼练特定神经网络架构之语义注,如意插槽对。 于本演文,介一易用之界面及其后端,当界面向领域专家,以收向向之对样本。 其平台不惟许以结构化收示例对,又给简注解释之法。 平台独立语言。 它仅决于特定言特定言处组件之可用性。 方以收拉脱维亚语(一言)样本,样本为弟子服事之典。', 'hi': 'आज, अधिकांश संवाद प्रणालियां पूरी तरह से या आंशिक रूप से तंत्रिका नेटवर्क आर्किटेक्चर का उपयोग करके बनाई गई हैं। एक लक्ष्य-उन्मुख तंत्रिका नेटवर्क संवाद प्रणाली के निर्माण के लिए एक महत्वपूर्ण शर्त एक डेटासेट है जो विशिष्ट संवाद परिदृश्यों का प्रतिनिधित्व करता है और इसमें विभिन्न शब्दार्थ एनोटेशन शामिल हैं, जैसे कि इरादे, स्लॉट और संवाद क्रियाएं, जो एक विशेष तंत्रिका नेटवर्क आर्किटेक्चर को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए आवश्यक हैं। इस प्रदर्शन पत्र में, हम इंटरफ़ेस का उपयोग करने में आसान और इसके बैक-एंड को प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो लक्ष्य-उन्मुख संवाद नमूनों के संग्रह के लिए डोमेन विशेषज्ञों के लिए उन्मुख है। मंच न केवल एक संरचित तरीके से नमूना संवादों को इकट्ठा करने या लिखने की अनुमति देता है, बल्कि संवादों की सरल एनोटेशन और व्याख्या के लिए एक साधन भी प्रदान करता है। मंच अपने आप में भाषा-स्वतंत्र है; यह केवल एक विशिष्ट भाषा के लिए विशेष भाषा प्रसंस्करण घटकों की उपलब्धता पर निर्भर करता है। वर्तमान में इसका उपयोग लातवियाई (एक अत्यधिक inflected भाषा) में संवाद के नमूने एकत्र करने के लिए किया जा रहा है जो छात्रों और छात्र सेवा के बीच विशिष्ट संचार का प्रतिनिधित्व करता है।', 'ru': 'Сегодня большинство диалоговых систем полностью или частично построены с использованием архитектур нейронных сетей. Важнейшей предпосылкой создания целевой системы диалога нейронной сети является набор данных, представляющий типичные сценарии диалога и включающий в себя различные семантические аннотации, например, намерения, слоты и диалоговые действия, которые необходимы для обучения конкретной архитектуры нейронной сети. В этом демонстрационном документе мы представляем простой в использовании интерфейс и его внутреннюю часть, которая ориентирована на экспертов домена для сбора целевых образцов диалога. Платформа не только позволяет собирать или писать образцы диалогов структурированным образом, но и предоставляет средства для простой аннотации и интерпретации диалогов. Сама платформа не зависит от языка, она зависит только от наличия определенных компонентов языковой обработки для конкретного языка. В настоящее время он используется для сбора образцов диалогов на латышском языке (сильно напыщенном языке), которые представляют собой типичное общение между студентами и студенческой службой.', 'ga': 'Sa lá atá inniu ann, tógtar an chuid is mó de na córais idirphlé go hiomlán nó go páirteach ag baint úsáide as ailtireachtaí líonraí néaracha. Réamhriachtanas ríthábhachtach chun córas dialóige néarlíonra spriocdhírithe a chruthú is ea tacar sonraí a léiríonn gnáthchásanna idirphlé agus a chuimsíonn nótaí shéimeantacha éagsúla, m.sh. intinn, sliotáin agus gníomhaíochtaí idirphlé, atá riachtanach chun oiliúint a chur ar ailtireacht líonraí néarúla ar leith. Sa pháipéar taispeána seo, cuirimid i láthair comhéadan atá éasca le húsáid agus a chúl-deireadh atá dírithe ar shaineolaithe fearainn chun samplaí dialóige spriocdhírithe a bhailiú. Ní hamháin go gceadaíonn an t-ardán comhráite samplacha a bhailiú nó a scríobh ar bhealach struchtúrtha, ach cuireann sé bealach ar fáil freisin chun anótáil agus léirmhíniú simplí ar na comhráite. Tá an t-ardán féin neamhspleách ar an teanga; braitheann sé ar infhaighteacht comhpháirteanna próiseála teanga ar leith do theanga ar leith amháin. Tá sé á úsáid faoi láthair chun samplaí comhphlé a bhailiú sa Laitvis (teanga an-infhillte) a léiríonn gnáthchumarsáid idir mic léinn agus seirbhís na mac léinn.', 'ka': 'დღეს, დიალოგის სისტემა ყველაფერად ან ნაწილაფერად შექმნილი ნეიროლური ქსელის აქტიქტიქტურებით გამოყენებული. უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი საჭირო სისტემის მისამართლური ნეიროლური ქსელის დიალოგის შექმნა არის მონაცემები, რომელიც განსაკუთრებულია ტიპური დიალოგის სინარიოები და აქვს განსხვავებული სმენტიკური ანოტაციები, მაგალითად მისამართ ამ დემონსტრაციის დოკუნტში ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ადვილი ინტერფექტის და მისი წინაღალდეს, რომელიც დიომინური ექსპერტებისთვის მომხმარებული დიალოგის კოლექციაში დავ პლატემატი არა მხოლოდ მხოლოდ შესაძლებელია სტრუქტურაციული გზით ან დაწერის დიალოგიების შესაძლებლობა, მაგრამ უკეთესი დიალოგიების განსხვავება და ინტერუქტურაცი პლატეფორმა თავიდან იყო ენის განსაზღვრება; ეს მხოლოდ განსაკუთრებული ენის პროცესი კომპონენტების ხელსაწყოთან მხოლოდ განსაკუთრებულია. მისი დღეს იყენება ლატვიანური (ძალიან ინფექტირებული ენაში) დიალოგის მონაცემებების კომუნიკაციაში, რომლებიც სტუდენტების და სტუდენტების სერვისთან ტიპური', 'el': 'Σήμερα, τα περισσότερα συστήματα διαλόγου κατασκευάζονται πλήρως ή εν μέρει χρησιμοποιώντας αρχιτεκτονικές νευρωνικών δικτύων. Μια κρίσιμη προϋπόθεση για τη δημιουργία ενός στοχοθετημένου συστήματος διαλόγου νευρωνικών δικτύων είναι ένα σύνολο δεδομένων που αντιπροσωπεύει τυπικά σενάρια διαλόγου και περιλαμβάνει διάφορες σημασιολογικές σημειώσεις, π.χ. προθέσεις, αυλακώσεις και ενέργειες διαλόγου, που είναι απαραίτητες για την εκπαίδευση μιας συγκεκριμένης αρχιτεκτονικής νευρωνικών δικτύων. Σε αυτό το έγγραφο επίδειξης, παρουσιάζουμε μια εύχρηστη διεπαφή και το πίσω μέρος του, το οποίο είναι προσανατολισμένο σε ειδικούς τομέα για τη συλλογή στοχευμένων δειγμάτων διαλόγου. Η πλατφόρμα όχι μόνο επιτρέπει τη συλλογή ή εγγραφή δειγματοληπτικών διαλόγων με δομημένο τρόπο, αλλά παρέχει επίσης ένα μέσο για απλή σχολιασμό και ερμηνεία των διαλόγων. Η ίδια η πλατφόρμα είναι ανεξάρτητη από γλώσσα· εξαρτάται μόνο από τη διαθεσιμότητα συγκεκριμένων στοιχείων επεξεργασίας γλώσσας για μια συγκεκριμένη γλώσσα. Αυτή τη στιγμή χρησιμοποιείται για τη συλλογή δειγμάτων διαλόγου στα λεττονικά (μια γλώσσα με υψηλή κλίση), τα οποία αντιπροσωπεύουν τυπική επικοινωνία μεταξύ των φοιτητών και των φοιτητικών υπηρεσιών.', 'hu': 'Napjainkban a legtöbb párbeszédrendszer teljesen vagy részben neurális hálózati architektúrákat használ. A célorientált neurális hálózati párbeszédrendszer létrehozásának kulcsfontosságú előfeltétele egy olyan adatkészlet, amely tipikus párbeszédforgatókönyveket képvisel, és amely különböző szemantikai megjegyzéseket tartalmaz, pl. szándékokat, réseket és párbeszédműveleteket, amelyek egy adott neurális hálózati architektúra képzéséhez szükségesek. Ebben a bemutatóban egy könnyen használható felületet és annak back-end-jét mutatjuk be, amely domain szakértők számára irányul a célorientált párbeszédminták gyűjtéséhez. A platform nem csak strukturált módon lehetővé teszi a párbeszédek gyűjtését vagy írását, hanem eszközt biztosít a párbeszédek egyszerű jegyzetelésére és értelmezésére is. Maga a platform nyelvfüggetlen; csak egy adott nyelvhez tartozó bizonyos nyelvfeldolgozó összetevők rendelkezésre állásától függ. Jelenleg lett nyelvű párbeszédminták gyűjtésére használják, amelyek a diákok és a hallgatói szolgálat közötti tipikus kommunikációt képviselik.', 'it': "Oggi, la maggior parte dei sistemi di dialogo sono completamente o parzialmente costruiti utilizzando architetture di rete neurale. Un prerequisito fondamentale per la creazione di un sistema di dialogo di rete neurale orientato agli obiettivi è un set di dati che rappresenta scenari di dialogo tipici e include varie annotazioni semantiche, ad esempio intenti, slot e azioni di dialogo, necessarie per formare una particolare architettura di rete neurale. In questo documento dimostrativo, presentiamo un'interfaccia facile da usare e il suo back-end orientato agli esperti di dominio per la raccolta di campioni di dialogo orientati agli obiettivi. La piattaforma non solo permette di raccogliere o scrivere dialoghi di esempio in modo strutturato, ma fornisce anche un mezzo per annotare e interpretare semplici dialoghi. La piattaforma stessa è indipendente dal linguaggio; dipende solo dalla disponibilità di particolari componenti di elaborazione linguistica per una lingua specifica. Attualmente viene utilizzato per raccogliere esempi di dialogo in lettone (una lingua molto inflessibile) che rappresentano la tipica comunicazione tra gli studenti e il servizio studentesco.", 'kk': 'Бүгін диалог жүйелерінің көпшілігі невралдық желі архитектураларымен толық не бөлек құрылады. Мақсатты невралдық желі диалог жүйесін құру үшін мақсатты алдындағы мәлімет - түрлі диалог сценариясын көрсетеді және бірнеше семантикалық белгілер, мысалы, невралдық желі архитектурасын оқыту үшін қажет болатын деректер қорлары. Бұл демонстрация қағазында, интерфейсті және оның артық соңына қолдануға оңай көмектеседі. Мақсатты диалог үлгілерін жинақтау үшін домен эксперттеріне бағытталған. Платформа тек құрылған түрде үлгі диалогтарын жинау не жазуға мүмкіндік бермейді, сондай-ақ диалогтардың қарапайым жазбаларын және түсініктемелерін қолданады. Платформа өзі тілден тәуелсіз. ол тек тілді өзгерту компоненттерінің жеткізіліктеріне тәуелді. Бұл қазіргі уақытта студенттер мен студенттер қызметі арасындағы әдетті байланысты диалог үлгілерін жинақтау үшін Латвия тілінде қолданылады.', 'lt': 'Today, most dialogue systems are fully or partly built using neural network architectures.  Pagrindinė prielaida sukurti tiksliniu požiūriu orientuotą neurologinio tinklo dialogo sistemą yra duomenų rinkinys, kuriame pateikiami tipiniai dialogo scenarijai ir kuriame pateikiamos įvairios semantinės anotacijos, pvz., ketinimai, laiko tarpsniai ir dialogo veiksmai, būtini tam tikrai neurologinio tinklo architektūrai mokymui. Šiame demonstraciniame dokumente pateikiama lengva naudoti sąsają ir jos galinę dalį, orientuotą į srities ekspertus renkant tikslinius dialogo pavyzdžius. Platforma ne tik leidžia rinkti arba rašyti mėginių dialogus struktūriškai, bet ir suteikia galimybę paprastai užrašyti ir aiškinti dialogus. pati platforma nepriklauso nuo kalbos; jis priklauso tik nuo tam tikrų kalbų apdorojimo sudedamųjų dalių prieinamumo konkrečiai kalbai. Šiuo metu jis naudojamas renkant dialogo pavyzdžius latvių kalba (labai paplitusia kalba), kurie yra tipiškas ryšys tarp student ų ir studentų tarnybos.', 'mk': 'Денес, повеќето дијалошки системи се целосно или делумно изградени користејќи архитектури на нервната мрежа. Клучен предуслов за создавање на систем за дијалог на нервната мрежа кој е ориентиран на цели е податок кој претставува типични дијалошки сценарија и вклучува различни семантични анотации, како што се намерите, слотовите и дијалошките дејства, кои се неопходни за обука на одредена нервна мрежа архитек Во оваа демонстрациска хартија, претставуваме лесно да се користи интерфејсот и неговиот заден крај кој е ориентиран на експерти од домените за собирање примероци од дијалог ориентиран на цели. Платформата не само што овозможува собирање или запишување на дијалози за примероци на структуриран начин, туку и обезбедува средства за едноставна анотација и интерпретација на дијалозите. Самата платформа е независна од јазикот; зависи само од достапноста на одредени компоненти за обработување јазик за одреден јазик. Моментно се користи за собирање примероци од дијалогот на латовски (високо привлечен јазик), кои претставуваат типична комуникација помеѓу студентите и студентската служба.', 'ms': 'Hari ini, kebanyakan sistem dialog dibina sepenuhnya atau sebahagian menggunakan arkitektur rangkaian saraf. Prerekwiżit penting untuk mencipta sistem dialog rangkaian saraf bertujuan tujuan adalah set data yang mewakili skenario dialog biasa dan termasuk pelbagai anotasi semantik, cth. niat, slot dan tindakan dialog, yang diperlukan untuk melatih arkitektur rangkaian saraf tertentu. In this demonstration paper, we present an easy to use interface and its back-end which is oriented to domain experts for the collection of goal-oriented dialogue samples.  Platform tidak hanya membenarkan mengumpulkan atau menulis dialog sampel dengan cara struktur, tetapi juga menyediakan cara untuk anotasi dan interpretasi sederhana dialog. Platform itu sendiri bebas dari bahasa; it depends only on the availability of particular language processing components for a specific language.  Ia kini digunakan untuk mengumpulkan sampel dialog dalam bahasa Latvia (bahasa yang sangat disebabkan) yang mewakili komunikasi biasa antara pelajar dan perkhidmatan pelajar.', 'ml': 'ഇന്ന്, മിക്കവാറും ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റം പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായോ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ഭാഗമായി ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക് ലക്ഷ്യമുള്ള ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റാള്\u200d ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റം സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റാണ്. അത് സാധാരണ ഡയലോഗ് സിനേറ്റിയുള്ള സംഭവങ്ങളെ പ്രതിനിധി ഈ പ്രദര്\u200dശനത്തിന്റെ പേപ്പറില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഇന്റര്\u200dമെസ്സും അതിന്റെ പിന്നിലെ അവസാനത്തേയും ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d എളുപ്പമാണ് കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നത്. അത് ഡൊമെ സാമ്പിള്\u200d ഡയലോഗുകള്\u200d ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുകയോ എഴുതുകയോ ചെയ്യുന്നതോ മാത്രമല്ല, ഡയലോഗുകളുടെ വിശദീകരണവും ലളിതമായ വിശദീ പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോം സ്വയം ഭാഷ സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യം; ഒരു പ്രത്യേക ഭാഷയ്ക്ക് വേണ്ടി വ്യക്തമായ ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഘടകങ്ങളുടെ ലഭ്യമല്ലാതെ അത് ആശ് ഇപ്പോള്\u200d ലാത്വിയനിലെ ഡയലോഗ് മാമ്പുകള്\u200d സംഘടിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അത് വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥികള്\u200dക്കും വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥികള്\u200dക്കും തമ', 'mn': 'Өнөөдөр ихэнх диалог системүүд мэдрэлийн сүлжээний архитектуруудыг ашиглан бүрэн эсвэл хэсэг хэсэг бүтээж байна. Цаг зорилготой мэдрэлийн сүлжээний диалог системийн бүтээх чухал шаардлагатай нөхцөл нь хэвийн диалог хувилбаруудыг илэрхийлдэг өгөгдлийн сүлжээний хувилбарууд юм. Жишээлбэл, зорилго, слотууд болон диалог үйл ажиллагаа нь тодорхой мэдрэлийн сүлж Энэ үзүүлэлтийн цаасан дээр бид интерфейсийг ашиглах амархан болон түүний ардын төгсгөлд нь зорилготой диалог хэмжээний цуглуулалт хийх мэргэжилтнүүдэд зорилготой. Платформ нь зөвхөн бүтээгдэхүүний шинжлэх диалогуудыг цуглуулах эсвэл бичих боломжгүй, мөн диалогуудын энгийн илтгэл болон түгээх арга хангадаг. Платформ өөрийгөө хэл хамааралтай. Энэ нь зөвхөн тодорхой хэл боловсруулах хэлбэрээс хамааралтай. Одоогоор энэ нь Латвийн (маш их нөлөөлдөг хэл) диалогын жишээ цуглуулахын тулд хэрэглэгддэг. Энэ нь оюутнууд болон оюутнуудын үйлчилгээ хоорондын ерөнхий харилцаа юм.', 'mt': 'Today, most dialogue systems are fully or partly built using neural network architectures.  Prerekwiżit kruċjali g ħall-ħolqien ta’ sistema ta’ djalogu għan-netwerk newrali huwa sett ta’ dejta li jirrappreżenta xenarji tipiċi ta’ djalogu u jinkludi annotazzjonijiet semantiċi varji, pereżempju intenzjonijiet, slots u azzjonijiet ta’ djalogu, li huma meħtieġa għat-taħriġ ta’ arkitettura partikolari tan-netwerk newrali. F’dan id-dokument ta’ dimostrazzjoni, qed nippreżentaw interfaċċja faċli biex tintuża u l-parti ta’ wara tagħha li hija orjentata lejn esperti tad-dominju għall-ġbir ta’ kampjuni ta’ djalogu orjentati lejn l-għanijiet. Il-pjattaforma mhux biss tippermetti li jinġabru jew jinkisbu djalogi ta’ kampjuni b’mod strutturat, iżda tipprovdi wkoll mezz għal annotazzjoni u interpretazzjoni sempliċi tad-djalogi. Il-pjattaforma nnifisha hija indipendenti mil-lingwa; tiddependi biss mid-disponibbiltà ta’ komponenti partikolari tal-ipproċessar tal-lingwi għal lingwa speċifika. Bħalissa qed jintuża biex jinġabru kampjuni ta’ djalogu bil-Latvjan (lingwa influwenti ħafna) li jirrappreżentaw komunikazzjoni tipika bejn l-istudenti u s-servizz tal-istudenti.', 'pl': 'Obecnie większość systemów dialogowych jest w pełni lub częściowo budowana przy użyciu architektur sieci neuronowych. Kluczowym warunkiem wstępnym stworzenia ukierunkowanego na cel systemu dialogu sieci neuronowej jest zbiór danych reprezentujący typowe scenariusze dialogu i zawierający różne adnotacje semantyczne, np. intencje, sloty i działania dialogowe, niezbędne do szkolenia konkretnej architektury sieci neuronowej. W niniejszym artykule demonstracyjnym przedstawiamy łatwy w użyciu interfejs i jego backend, który jest skierowany do ekspertów domeny do zbierania ukierunkowanych na cel próbek dialogu. Platforma umożliwia nie tylko zbieranie lub zapisywanie przykładowych dialogów w ustrukturyzowany sposób, ale także zapewnia środek do prostej adnotacji i interpretacji dialogów. Sama platforma jest niezależna od języka; zależy wyłącznie od dostępności poszczególnych komponentów przetwarzania języka dla danego języka. Obecnie jest on wykorzystywany do zbierania próbek dialogu w języku łotewskim (języku wysoce przekształconym), które reprezentują typową komunikację między studentami a służbą studencką.', 'no': 'I dag er dei fleste dialogsystema fullstendig eller delvis bygd med neuralnettverksarkitekturar. Eit viktig førehandsvising for oppretting av eit målsorientert dialogvindauge er eit datasett som representerer typiske dialogscenarioar og inneheld ulike semantiske notasjonar, f.eks. uttrykk, plassar og dialoghandlingar, som er nødvendig for opplæring av ein spesielt neuralnettverkstarkitektur. I denne demonstrasjonspapiret presenterer vi ei enkel å bruka grensesnitt og bakgrunnsfargen som er orientert til domeneekspertar for samlinga av målsorienterte dialogprøver. Plattformet kan ikkje berre samla eller skriva prøveprøvedialogar på ein strukturert måte, men tilbyr også ein måte for enkle annotasjon og tolking av dialogane. Plattformet sjølv er språk uavhengig. Det er berre avhengig av tilgjengeligheten av spesielle språkshandsamar- komponentar for eit spesielt språk. Det vert no brukt for å samla dialogprøver i latvisk (ein svært influsert språk) som representerer typisk kommunikasjon mellom studentene og studenttenesten.', 'ro': 'Astăzi, majoritatea sistemelor de dialog sunt construite integral sau parțial folosind arhitecturi de rețele neurale. O condiție esențială pentru crearea unui sistem de dialog al rețelei neurale orientat spre obiective este un set de date care reprezintă scenarii tipice de dialog și include diverse adnotări semantice, de exemplu intenții, sloturi și acțiuni de dialog, necesare pentru formarea unei anumite arhitecturi de rețea neurală. În această lucrare demonstrativă, vă prezentăm o interfață ușor de utilizat și back-end-ul său, orientată spre experții domeniului pentru colectarea de mostre de dialog orientate spre obiective. Platforma nu numai că permite colectarea sau scrierea exemplelor de dialoguri într-un mod structurat, ci oferă, de asemenea, un mijloc de adnotare și interpretare simplă a dialogurilor. Platforma în sine este independentă de limbă; depinde numai de disponibilitatea anumitor componente de procesare a limbii pentru o anumită limbă. Acesta este utilizat în prezent pentru a colecta mostre de dialog în letonă (o limbă foarte inflectată) care reprezintă comunicarea tipică între studenți și serviciul studențesc.', 'so': 'Maanta, nidaamka bulshada badankoodu waxay si buuxda ah u dhisan yihiin ama qeyb ka mid ah isticmaalayaal dhismaha shabakadda neurada. A crucial prerequisite for the creation of a goal-oriented neural network dialogue system is a dataset that represents typical dialogue scenarios and includes various semantic annotations, e.g. intents, slots and dialogue actions, that are necessary for training a particular neural network architecture.  Qoraalkan muuqashada waxaynu soo bandhignaa fudud oo aan isticmaalno Interfac iyo dhammaadkeeda, taas oo loogu talogalay khabiiriyiinta guriga, si aan u soo ururiyo samooyin dialog la hago. Jardiinoku ma ogolaan karo in uu soo ururiyo ama ku qoro dialogueoyinka samooyinka oo kaliya, laakiin wuxuu sidoo kale u fidiyaa qaab fudud oo ku saabsan turjumista dialogueyada. Jardiinoyinka qudhiisa waa mid aan luqad lahayn; waxay ku xiran tahay in ay heli karto qeybaha baaritaanka luuqada gaarka ah ee luuqad gaar ah. Imtixaanka waxaa lagu isticmaalaa in lagu soo ururiyo samooyin dialog ah oo ku qoran Latvian (luuqad aad u saabsan) oo ka mid ah xiriir caadi ah oo u dhexeeya ardayda iyo adeegga ardayda.', 'sv': 'Idag är de flesta dialogsystem helt eller delvis byggda med hjälp av neurala nätverksarkitekturer. En avgörande förutsättning för skapandet av ett målinriktat neuralt nätverksdialogsystem är en datauppsättning som representerar typiska dialogscenarier och innehåller olika semantiska anteckningar, t.ex. intentioner, slots och dialogåtgärder, som är nödvändiga för att utbilda en viss neuralt nätverksarkitektur. I detta demonstrationsarbete presenterar vi ett lättanvänt gränssnitt och dess back-end som är inriktat på domänexperter för insamling av målinriktade dialogprover. Plattformen gör det inte bara möjligt att samla in eller skriva exempeldialoger på ett strukturerat sätt, utan ger också ett sätt att enkelt kommentera och tolka dialogerna. Plattformen är språkoberoende. Det beror endast på tillgången på vissa språkbehandlingskomponenter för ett visst språk. Den används för närvarande för att samla in dialogprover på lettiska (ett mycket influerat språk) som representerar typisk kommunikation mellan studenter och studenttjänsten.', 'ta': 'இன்று, பெரும்பாலான உரையாடல் அமைப்புகள் முழுமையாக அல்லது பகுதியாக புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் உருவாக்கப்பட்டு இலக்கு திரும்ப பிணைய பிணைய உரையாடல் முறைமையை உருவாக்க ஒரு முக்கியமான முன்னுரிமை இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் ஒரு எளிதான இடைமுகத்தையும் அதன் பின்னணி முடிவையையும் பயன்படுத்த வேண்டும். இது களத்தில் சேர்க்கப்பட்ட கோள் ச மாதிரி உரையாடல் மாதிரி உரையாடல்களை கட்டுப்பட்ட வழியில் சேகரிக்க அல்லது எழுத அனுமதிக்க முடியாது, இவ்வாறே உரையாடல்களின் சுலபமான அறிவ மொழி சுதந்திரமாகும். குறிப்பிட்ட மொழிக்கு செயல்படுத்தும் பொருள்களை மட்டுமே சார்ந்திருக்கிறது. தற்போது இது மாணவர்களுக்கும் மாணவர்களுக்கும் மாணவர்களுக்கும் இடையே வழக்கமான தொடர்புகளை குறிப்பிடும் லாட்வியனில் உரையாடல் மா', 'sr': 'Danas, većina dijalogskih sistema su potpuno ili djelomično izgrađena koristeći neuralnu mrežu arhitekture. Ključno predviđenje za stvaranje sustava dijaloga sa ciljevima orijentiranog na neuralnu mrežu je seta podataka koja predstavlja tipične scenarije dijaloga i uključuje različite semantičke annotacije, npr. namere, slote i dijalogske akcije, koje su potrebne za obuku određene neuralne mreže arhitekture. U ovom demonstracijskom papiru predstavljamo lako korištenje interfejsa i njegovog zadnjeg kraja koji je orientisan na eksperte domena za kolekciju uzorka dijaloga orientisanih na cilj. Platforma ne samo omogućava skupljati ili napisati uzorak dialoga na strukturiran način, nego takođe pruža sredstva za jednostavnu annotaciju i interpretaciju dialoga. Sama platforma je jezik nezavisna; zavisi samo o raspoloženju posebnih komponenata obrade jezika za određeni jezik. Trenutno se koristi za sakupljanje uzorka dijaloga na latinskom (vrlo uticajnom jeziku), koji predstavljaju tipičnu komunikaciju između studenata i studentskih usluga.', 'si': 'අද, ගොඩක් සංවාදය පද්ධතිය සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම නිර්මාණ ජාලය සංවාදය භාවිතා කරනවා. ඉලක්කම් ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ සංවාදක පද්ධතිය සැකසුම් සැකසුම් සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය සංවාදක සැකසුම් සැකසුම් සඳහා විවිධ සෙමැන්ටික් ආරංචිකරණය සම්බන්ධ කරනවා වගේ  මේ ප්\u200dරදර්ශනය පැත්තේ, අපි පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් අන්තර්ගය සහ පිටිපස්සෙන් පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහක් තියෙනවා  සංවාදයක් සංවාදය සම්පූර්ණ සංවාදයක් සංවාදය සම්පූර්ණ කරන්න සහ ලියන්න සම්පූර්ණ සංවාදයක් විතරක් නෙවෙ ප්ලේටෆ්ටෝම්ප් එක තමයි භාෂාව ස්වයංගයෙන්; ඒක විශේෂ භාෂාවක් වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂ භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක කාරණාවක් විතරයි. දැන් ඒක ලැට්වියාන් වල සංවාදයක් සංවාදය සම්පූර්ණය කරන්න භාවිත කරනවා (ගොඩක් සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාවක්) ඒක ප්\u200dරයෝජ', 'ur': 'آج، اکثر ڈالیلوگ سیسٹم پورے یا حصہ سے نیورال نیٹ ورک معماری کے مطابق بنائے جاتے ہیں. ایک مقصد منظور نائرول نیٹورک ڈالیوسٹم کی پیدائش کے لئے ایک ضروری ضروری ضرورت ہے جو ایک ڈاٹ سٹم ہے جسے معمولی دیالوگ سناریوں کی نمایش کرتا ہے اور مختلف سیمنٹی انٹاریوں میں شامل کرتا ہے، جیسے ارادہ، اسلوٹ اور ڈالیوں کے اقدامات، جو ایک خاص نورول نیٹورک آ اس نمونش کاغذ میں ہم ایک آسان انتشار اور اس کے پچھلے آنڈ کا استعمال کرنے کے لیے پیش کرتے ہیں جو ڈومین متخصص لوگوں کے لیے مقصد منزل کے ڈالیوں نمونے کے لئے منزل کی جاتی ہے پلٹورم صرف ایک ساختہ طریقے سے نمونہ ڈالیوں کو جمع یا لکھنے کی اجازت نہیں دیتا، بلکہ اس کے لئے بھی سادھی یادہانی اور ڈالیوں کی تعبیر کے لئے ایک وسیع پیدا کرتا ہے. پلٹورم خود ہی زبان سے بے نیاز ہے۔ یہ صرف ایک مخصوص زبان پردازی کی اجزاء کے موجود ہونے پر ہے۔ یہ اکثر لٹوین (ایک بہت اثرات زبان) میں دائیلوگ نمونے جمع کرنے کے لئے استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں جو دانش آموزوں اور دانش آموزوں کے درمیان عادت کی ارتباط کرتی ہیں.', 'uz': "Bugun, ko'pchilik muloqat tizimi neyrol tarmoqning maktablari bilan bir qismi yaratiladi. Name Bu tashkilotlar daftarida, Interfeys va orqa oxirgi qoʻshish uchun foydalanamiz, bu domen ekspertlariga ega bo'lgan muloqat muloqatlarini birlashtirish uchun qo'llanmalar. Name Ushbu platform o'zida o'z til'tibor emas; bu faqat foydalanuvchi tilni boshqarish komponentlariga ishlatadi. Joriy paytda, bu muloqat misollarini olib tashlash uchun foydalanadi, bu o'quvchilar va o'quvchilar xizmatlari орасида oddiy aloqalarni hisoblash mumkin.", 'vi': 'Ngày nay, hầu hết hệ thống đối thoại được xây dựng hoàn toàn bằng kiến trúc mạng thần kinh. Một điều kiện quan trọng để tạo ra một hệ thống liên lạc về mạng thần kinh có mục đích là một bộ dữ liệu đại diện cho các hoàn cảnh cuộc đối thoại điển hình và bao g ồm các ghi chú theo ngữ pháp khác nhau, ví dụ như ý định, khe hở và hành động đối thoại, cần thiết để đào tạo một cấu trúc mạng thần kinh đặc biệt. Trong tờ báo trình bày này, chúng tôi có một giao diện dễ sử dụng và hậu phương của nó được hướng dẫn tới chuyên gia lãnh thổ để thu thập các mẫu cuộc đối thoại nhằm mục đích. The platform không chỉ cho phép thu thập hay viết các thoại mẫu theo cách cấu trúc, mà còn cung cấp một phương tiện cho việc ghi chú đơn giản và giải thích của các buổi thoại. Bản thân bục độc lập ngôn ngữ; nó chỉ phụ thuộc vào khả năng có các thành phần xử lý ngôn ngữ cụ thể cho một ngôn ngữ cụ thể. Nó đang được dùng để thu thập các mẫu đối thoại ở Latvia (một ngôn ngữ có nhiều người nhập vào) tượng trưng cho liên lạc thông thường giữa học sinh và dịch vụ sinh viên.', 'nl': "Tegenwoordig worden de meeste dialogsystemen geheel of gedeeltelijk gebouwd met behulp van neurale netwerkarchitecturen. Een cruciale voorwaarde voor het creëren van een doelgericht neuraal netwerk dialoogsysteem is een dataset die typische dialoogscenario's weergeeft en verschillende semantische annotaties bevat, zoals intenties, slots en dialoogacties, die nodig zijn voor het trainen van een bepaalde neuraal netwerk architectuur. In dit demonstratiedocument presenteren we een gebruiksvriendelijke interface en de back-end die is gericht op domeinexperts voor het verzamelen van doelgerichte dialoogvoorbeelden. Het platform maakt niet alleen het verzamelen of schrijven van voorbeelddialogen op een gestructureerde manier mogelijk, maar biedt ook een middel voor eenvoudige annotatie en interpretatie van de dialogen. Het platform zelf is taalonafhankelijk; Het hangt alleen af van de beschikbaarheid van bepaalde taalverwerkingscomponenten voor een specifieke taal. Het wordt momenteel gebruikt voor het verzamelen van dialogvoorbeelden in het Lets (een sterk geïnjecteerde taal) die typische communicatie tussen studenten en de studentendienst vertegenwoordigen.", 'bg': 'Днес повечето диалогови системи са изцяло или частично изградени, използвайки архитектури на невронни мрежи. Важна предпоставка за създаването на целенасочена система за диалог на невронната мрежа е набор от данни, който представя типични диалогови сценарии и включва различни семантични анотации, например намерения, слотове и диалогови действия, които са необходими за обучението на определена архитектура на невронната мрежа. В тази демонстрационна статия представяме лесен за използване интерфейс и неговия бекенд, който е ориентиран към експерти в областта за събиране на целенасочени диалогови проби. Платформата не само позволява да се събират или пишат примерни диалози по структуриран начин, но и осигурява средство за проста анотация и интерпретация на диалозите. Самата платформа е независима от езика; зависи само от наличието на определени компоненти за обработка на езика за конкретен език. Понастоящем тя се използва за събиране на образци от диалог на латвийски (силно променен език), които представляват типична комуникация между студентите и студентската служба.', 'da': 'I dag er de fleste dialogsystemer helt eller delvist bygget ved hjælp af neurale netværksarkitekturer. En afgørende forudsætning for oprettelsen af et målorienteret neuralt netværksdialogsystem er et datasæt, der repræsenterer typiske dialogscenarier og indeholder forskellige semantiske noteringer, f.eks. hensigter, slots og dialoghandlinger, der er nødvendige for at træne en bestemt neuralt netværksarkitektur. I dette demonstrationsdokument præsenterer vi en brugervenlig grænseflade og dens back-end, som er orienteret til domæneeksperter til indsamling af målorienterede dialogprøver. Platformen giver ikke kun mulighed for at indsamle eller skrive eksempeldialoger på en struktureret måde, men giver også et middel til enkel notering og fortolkning af dialogerne. Selve platformen er sproguafhængig det afhænger kun af tilgængeligheden af bestemte sprogbehandlingskomponenter for et bestemt sprog. Den bruges i øjeblikket til at indsamle dialogprøver på lettisk (et meget influeret sprog), som repræsenterer typisk kommunikation mellem studerende og elevtjenesten.', 'hr': 'Danas je većina dijalogskih sustava potpuno ili djelomično izgrađena koristeći arhitekture neuralne mreže. Ključno predviđenje za stvaranje sustava dijaloga s ciljevima orientiranog na neuralnu mrežu predstavlja komplet podataka koji predstavlja tipične scenarije dijaloga i uključuje različite semantičke annotacije, npr. namjere, slotove i dijalogske akcije koje su potrebne za obuku određene arhitekture neuralne mreže. U ovom demonstracijskom papiru predstavljamo lako korištenje interfejsa i njegovog zadnjeg kraja koji je usmjeren na stručnjake domena za skupljanje uzorka dijaloga orientiranog cilja. Platforma ne samo omogućava skupljati ili napisati dijalogove uzoraka na strukturiran način, nego također pruža sredstva za jednostavnu annotaciju i interpretaciju dijaloga. Sama platforma je jezik nezavisna; ovisi samo o dostupnosti određenih dijelova obrade jezika za određeni jezik. Trenutno se koristi za prikupljanje uzorka dijaloga na latinskom (vrlo uticajnom jeziku) koji predstavljaju tipičnu komunikaciju između studenata i studentske službe.', 'de': 'Heute werden die meisten Dialogsysteme ganz oder teilweise mit neuronalen Netzwerkarchitekturen gebaut. Eine entscheidende Voraussetzung für die Schaffung eines zielorientierten neuronalen Netzwerkdialogsystems ist ein Datensatz, der typische Dialogszenarien darstellt und verschiedene semantische Anmerkungen enthält, z.B. Intents, Slots und Dialogaktionen, die für das Training einer bestimmten neuronalen Netzwerkarchitektur notwendig sind. In diesem Demonstrationspapier stellen wir eine einfach zu bedienende Schnittstelle und deren Backend vor, die sich an Domain-Experten für die Sammlung zielgerichteter Dialogbeispiele richtet. Die Plattform ermöglicht nicht nur, Beispieldialoge strukturiert zu sammeln oder zu schreiben, sondern bietet auch ein Mittel zur einfachen Annotation und Interpretation der Dialoge. Die Plattform selbst ist sprachunabhängig; Es hängt nur von der Verfügbarkeit bestimmter Sprachverarbeitungskomponenten für eine bestimmte Sprache ab. Es wird derzeit verwendet, um Dialogbeispiele auf Lettisch (einer stark verflochtenen Sprache) zu sammeln, die typische Kommunikation zwischen Studierenden und dem Studierendenservice darstellen.', 'id': 'Hari ini, kebanyakan sistem dialog dibangun sepenuhnya atau sebagian menggunakan arsitektur jaringan saraf. Sebuah syarat awal penting untuk menciptakan sistem dialog jaringan saraf orientasi tujuan adalah set data yang mewakili skenario dialog tipis dan termasuk berbagai anotasi semantis, misalnya niat, slot dan tindakan dialog, yang diperlukan untuk melatih arsitektur jaringan saraf tertentu. Dalam kertas demonstrasi ini, kami mempersembahkan antarmuka yang mudah digunakan dan bagian belakangnya yang mengarientasi para ahli domain untuk koleksi sampel dialog yang mengarientasi tujuan. Platform tidak hanya memungkinkan untuk mengumpulkan atau menulis dialog sampel dengan cara strukturasi, tetapi juga menyediakan cara untuk anotasi sederhana dan interpretasi dialog. The platform itself is language-independent;  tergantung hanya pada keberhasilan komponen proses bahasa tertentu untuk bahasa tertentu. Saat ini digunakan untuk mengumpulkan sampel dialog dalam bahasa Latvia (bahasa yang sangat terpengaruh) yang mewakili komunikasi tipis antara siswa dan layanan siswa.', 'ko': '현재 대부분의 대화 시스템은 신경 네트워크 구조로 구축되어 있다.목표를 대상으로 하는 신경 네트워크 대화 시스템을 만드는 관건적인 선결 조건은 하나의 데이터 집합이다. 이 데이터 집합은 전형적인 대화 장면을 대표하고 특정한 신경 네트워크 구조를 훈련하는 데 필요한 각종 의미 주석, 예를 들어 의도, 틈새와 대화 동작을 포함한다.본 프레젠테이션 파일에서 우리는 사용하기 쉬운 인터페이스와 백엔드를 제공했다. 이 인터페이스는 분야 전문가를 대상으로 하고 목표를 대상으로 하는 대화 견본을 수집하는 데 사용된다.이 플랫폼은 구조화된 방식으로 예시적인 대화를 수집하거나 작성할 수 있을 뿐만 아니라 대화에 대해 간단한 주석과 해석을 할 수 있는 방법을 제공한다.플랫폼 자체가 언어에 독립한다.그것은 특정 언어의 특정 언어 처리 구성 요소의 가용성에 달려 있다.그것은 현재 라트비아어 (고도로 변형된 언어) 의 대화 샘플을 수집하는 데 사용되며, 학생과 학생 서비스 기구 간의 전형적인 교류를 대표한다.', 'fa': 'امروز، بیشتر سیستم\u200cهای گفتگو کامل یا بخشی از طریق معماری شبکه عصبی ساخته می\u200cشوند. یک پیش\u200cبینی مهم برای ایجاد یک سیستم شبکه\u200cهای شبکه\u200cهای عصبی که به هدف ارائه می\u200cدهند، یک مجموعه داده\u200cای است که نشان می\u200cدهد سیناریو\u200cهای مشاوره\u200cای معمولی و شامل نشان\u200cدهنده\u200cهای متفاوتی، مثال هدف، نقطه\u200cها و حرکات\u200cهای مشاوره\u200cای است که برای آموزش یک معماری شبکه عصب در این کاغذ نمایش، ما یک راحتی برای استفاده از interface ش و پشتیبانی آن را نشان می دهیم که به متخصص دانشجویان دامنه برای جمع نمونه\u200cهای نمونه\u200cهای صحبت\u200cکننده\u200cی هدف راهنمایی می\u200cشود. Platform نه تنها اجازه می دهد که dialogهای نمونه را در یک راه ساخته جمع یا نوشته کند، بلکه همچنین وسیله\u200cای برای یادآوری ساده و تعبیر دادن диалогها را پیشنهاد می\u200cکند. Platform itself is language-independent; این فقط بستگی به موجودات بخش\u200cهای پردازش زبان خاص برای یک زبان خاص است. در حال حاضر برای جمع نمونه\u200cهای گفتگوی در لاتین (زبان بسیار تاثیر\u200cگیری) استفاده می\u200cشود که ارتباط معمولی بین دانشجویان و خدمت دانشجویان است.', 'sw': 'Leo, mifumo mingi ya mazungumzo imejengwa kwa kutumia majengo ya mitandao ya kisasa. Utawala muhimu wa kutengeneza mfumo wa mazungumzo ya kijamii yenye lengo ni seti ya data inayowakilisha hali ya mazungumzo ya kawaida na inajumuisha matangazo mbalimbali ya kisiasa, kwa mfano nia, mistari na mazungumzo, ambayo ni muhimu kwa ajili ya mafunzo ya ujenzi maalum wa mtandao wa neurali. Katika karatasi hii ya maandamano, tunaweka nyepesi ya kutumia nyuso na mwishoni wake ambao unaelekezwa kwa wataalam wa ndani kwa ajili ya kukusanya sampuli za mazungumzo yenye malengo. Jukwaa hilo si tu linaruhusu kukusanya au kuandika mazungumzo ya sampuli kwa njia ya ujenzi, bali pia inatoa njia ya kutangaza na tafsiri ya mazungumzo rahisi. Jukwaa hili yenyewe ni huru kwa lugha; inategemea tu upatikanaji wa vifaa maalum vya upasuaji wa lugha kwa lugha maalum. Hivi sasa inatumiwa kukusanya sampuli za mazungumzo nchini Latvia (lugha yenye ushawishi mkubwa) ambayo inawakilisha mawasiliano ya kawaida kati ya wanafunzi na huduma ya wanafunzi.', 'af': "Vandag is die meeste dialoog stelsels volledig of deel gebou met gebruik van neuralnetwerk arkitektuure. 'n Kruistelike voorspoediging vir die skepping van 'n doel-orienteerde neuralnetwerk dialoog stelsel is 'n datastel wat verteenwoordig tipiese dialoog scenarios en insluit verskeie semantiese notasies, bv. bedoelings, slots en dialoog aksies, wat nodig is vir die onderwerp van 'n bepaalde neuralnetwerk-arkitektuur. In hierdie demonstrasie papier, voorsien ons 'n maklik om koppelvlak te gebruik en sy terugend wat is orienteer na domein eksperte vir die versameling van doel-orienteerde dialoog voorbeelde. Die platforme laat nie slegs toe om voorbeeld dialoog te samel of skryf op 'n struktureerde manier nie, maar ook 'n betekening verskaf vir eenvoudige annotasie en uitlegging van die dialoog. Die platforma self is taal-onafhanklike; dit afhang slegs van die beskikbaarheid van spesifieke taal verwerking komponente vir 'n spesifieke taal. Dit word tans gebruik om dialoog voorbeelde in Latviaanse te samel ( 'n baie inflekke taal) wat tipiese kommunikasie tussen studente en die studentdiens verteenwoordig word.", 'tr': 'Bu gün, köp dijalog sistemalary neural şebek arhitektarlaryny ulanyp doly ýa-da bölümden inşa edildi. Möhüm g örkezilýän neiral şebek sistemasyny bejermek üçin wajyp bir hereket däldir we munyň dürli dijalog senaryony a ňlap meýilleşdirýän, meselâ, niýetler, slotler we dijalog emelleri, beýleki näral şebek arhitektegi bejermek üçin gerekli data setidir. Bu demostrasiýa kagyzynda, biz interface we arka tarapyny ulanmak aňsatly çykýarys. Bu nusga görkezilýän dialogyň örneklerine görkezilýän domen uzmanlaryna görkezilýän. Plataforma diňe örnek dialoglary ýygnamak ýa-da ýazmak üçin mümkin däl däldir, ýöne dialoglaryň basit täzelikleri we terjimeleri üçin bir örnek saýlaýar. Plataforma özi dilden bağlanmaýar; Bu diňe belli diller üçin belli diller işleýän işeňleri bar. Häzirçe bu ýer okuwçylar we okuwçylar häsiýetiniň arasyndaky dialogyň örneklerini ýygnamak üçin ulanylýar.', 'sq': 'Sot, shumica e sistemeve të dialogut janë ndërtuar plotësisht ose pjesërisht duke përdorur arkitektura të rrjetit nervor. Një parakusht vendimtar për krijimin e një sistemi të dialogut të rrjetit nervor me qëllim është një sërë të dhënash që përfaqëson skenarë tipike të dialogut dhe përfshin anotacione të ndryshme semantike, për shembull synime, slots dhe veprime dialogu, që janë të nevojshme për trainimin e një arkitekture të veçantë rrjeti nervor. Në këtë letër demonstrimi, ne paraqesim një interfaqe të lehtë për të përdorur dhe pjesën e pasme të saj që është e orientuar ndaj ekspertëve të fushës për mbledhjen e mostrave të dialogut me qëllim. Platforma jo vetëm lejon të mbledhë apo shkruajë dialogu mostrash në një mënyrë të strukturuar, por gjithashtu ofron një mjet për anotacion të thjeshtë dhe interpretim të dialogut. Platforma vetë është e pavarur nga gjuha; varet vetëm nga dispozicioni i komponenteve të posaçme të procesimit të gjuhës për një gjuhë të posaçme. Ajo po përdoret aktualisht për të mbledhur mostrat e dialogut në letonisht (një gjuhë shumë e prekur) që përfaqësojnë komunikimin tipik midis student ëve dhe shërbimit të studentëve.', 'am': 'ዛሬ፣ አብዛኛዎቹ የጥያቄ መረብ መሠረት መዝገብ የተሠሩ ወይም ተካፈሉ ይሠራሉ፡፡ አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር በዚህ በማስታወቂያው ፕሮግራም፣ የግንኙነቱን እና የጀርባውን ፍጻሜ ለመጠቀም ቀላል እናስቀራለን፡፡ ፕሮግራሙ ምረጡ ምሳሌዎችን በመቀበል ወይም በመጻፍ ብቻ አይፈቅድም፥ ነገር ግን ለመስመር እና ለመተረጉም የሚችል ማሰናከል ነው፡፡ የደረጃው ራሱ ቋንቋ-ነፃ ነው፤ በተለየ ቋንቋ አካባቢ ክፍለ ቋንቋ ማግኘት ብቻ ነው፡፡ አሁን በተማሪዎች እና ተማሪዎቹ አገልግሎት መካከል የጥያቄ ግንኙነት በሚያሳየው በLatvian (እጅግ በተለየ ቋንቋ) ምሳሌዎችን ለመቀበል ይጠቀማል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այսօր, երկխոսային համակարգերի մեծ մասը ամբողջովին կամ մասամբ կառուցված են նյարդային ցանցի ճարտարապետություններով: Նյարդային ցանցի հաղորդակցման համակարգի ստեղծման կարևոր նախապայմանը տվյալների համակարգ է, որը ներկայացնում է տիպիկ հաղորդակցման սցենարներ և ներառում է տարբեր սեմանտիկ նոտացիաներ, օրինակ նպատակներ, պահեր և հաղորդակցման գործողություններ, որոնք անհրաժեշտ են նյարդային ցան In this demonstration paper, we present an easy to use interface and its back-end which is oriented to domain experts for the collection of goal-oriented dialogue samples.  Համակարգը ոչ միայն թույլ է տալիս հավաքել կամ գրել նմուշների պատկերացումներ կառուցվածված կերպ, այլ նաև միջոց է տալիս պատկերացումների պարզ նշումների և թարգմանման համար: Ամեն հարթակը անկախ է լեզվից, այն կախված է միայն որոշակի լեզվի վերամշակման բաղադրիչների հասանելիության վրա: Այն ներկայումս օգտագործվում է Լաբանական լեզվով (բարձր ազդեցություն ունեցող լեզվով) խոսակցության նմուշներ հավաքելու համար, որոնք ներկայացնում են ուսանողների և ուսանողների միջև բնորոշ հաղորդակցություն:', 'bn': 'আজকে, বেশীরভাগ ডায়ালগ সিস্টেম নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামো ব্যবহার করে পুরোপুরি বা অংশ নির্মাণ করা হয়েছে। একটি গোলাল-পরিচিত নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ডায়ালগ সিস্টেম তৈরি করার জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ প্রযোজন হচ্ছে একটি ডাটাসেট যা সাধারণ ডায়ালগের সাথে প্রতিনিধিত্ব করে এবং এর মধ্যে বিভিন্ন সেমান্টিক ব এই প্রতিবাদ পত্রিকায়, আমরা ইন্টারফেস এবং এর পেছনের শেষ ব্যবহার করার সহজ একটি সংখ্যা উপস্থাপন করি যা ডোমেইন বিশেষজ্ঞদের উদ্দেশ্যে লক্ষ্যের উদ্দে এই প্ল্যাটফর্ম শুধুমাত্র কাঠামোর ভাবে নমুনাল ডায়ালগ সংগ্রহ করা অথবা লিখার অনুমতি দেয় না, বরং ডায়ালগের ব্যাখ্যা এবং ব্যাখ্যা করা প্ল্যাটফর্ম নিজেই ভাষা স্বাধীন; এটি শুধুমাত্র একটি নির্দিষ্ট ভাষার জন্য বিশেষ ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার উপাদানের উপর নির্ভর করে। বর্তমানে এটি ল্যাটভিয়ানে ডায়ালগের নমুনা সংগ্রহ করার জন্য ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে (একটি অত্যন্ত প্রভাবিত ভাষা) যা ছাত্র ও ছাত্র সেবা সার্ভি', 'az': 'Bu gün, çox dijalog sistemləri nöral ağ arhitektarıyla tamamilə və ya bölümlə inşa edilir. Möcüzə tərəf tərəf g östərilmiş nöral a ğ dijaloğu sisteminin yaratması üçün çox mühüm bir əvvəlcə məlumatdır. Bu, nöral ağ arhitektarını təhsil etmək üçün müəyyən edilən məlumatlar, məlumatlar, slot və dijaloğu işləridir. Bu göstərmə kağıdında, biz interfejsini və onun arxa tərəflərini istifadə etmək üçün asanlıq göstəririk ki, məqsəd-tərəflərin məlumatlarının qovuşduğu domain ekspertlərinə yönəldir. Platforma yalnız strukturlu yolla nümunə dialoglarını toplamağa və yazmağa izin vermir, lakin dialogların basit tərzlərini və yozumunu də sağlar. Platforma özü dildən bağımsızdır; Bu yalnız müəyyən dil işləmə komponentlərinin mümkün olmasına bağlı. Şu and a öğrencilər və öğrencilər hizməsi arasındakı tipik iletişim məlumatlarını Latvian dilində toplamaq üçün qullanılır.', 'bs': 'Danas, većina dijalogskih sustava su potpuno ili djelomično izgrađena koristeći neuralnu mrežu arhitekture. Ključno predviđenje za stvaranje sustava dijaloga sa ciljem orientiranog neuromreža je komplet podataka koji predstavlja tipične scenarije dijaloga i uključuje različite semantičke annotacije, npr. namjere, slote i dijalogske akcije, koje su potrebne za obuku određene arhitekture neuralne mreže. U ovom demonstracijskom papiru predstavljamo lako korištenje interfejsa i njenog zadnjeg kraja koji je usmjeren na stručnike domena za kolekciju uzorka dijaloga orientiranih na cilj. Platforma ne samo omogućava skupljati ili napisati uzorke dijaloge na strukturiran način, nego također pruža sredstva za jednostavnu annotaciju i interpretaciju dijaloga. Sama platforma je jezik nezavisna; ovisi samo o dostupnosti određenih komponenta obrade jezika za određeni jezik. Trenutno se koristi za skupljanje uzorka dijaloga na latinskom (vrlo uticajnom jeziku), koji predstavljaju tipičnu komunikaciju između studenata i studentske službe.', 'cs': 'Dnes je většina dialogových systémů plně nebo částečně postavena pomocí architektur neuronových sítí. Klíčovým předpokladem pro vytvoření cílově orientovaného dialogového systému neuronové sítě je datová sada, která reprezentuje typické dialogové scénáře a obsahuje různé sémantické anotace, např. záměry, sloty a dialogové akce, které jsou nezbytné pro trénink konkrétní architektury neuronové sítě. V tomto ukázkovém článku představujeme snadno použitelné rozhraní a jeho back-end, který je orientován na odborníky v oblasti sběru cílově orientovaných dialogových vzorků. Platforma umožňuje nejen strukturovaným způsobem sbírat nebo psát ukázkové dialogy, ale také poskytuje prostředky pro jednoduchou anotaci a interpretaci dialogů. Platforma sama je jazykově nezávislá; závisí pouze na dostupnosti konkrétních komponent zpracování jazyka pro konkrétní jazyk. V současné době se používá ke sběru vzorků dialogu v lotyštině (vysoce influenčním jazyce), které představují typickou komunikaci mezi studenty a studentskou službou.', 'et': 'Tänapäeval on enamik dialoogisüsteeme täielikult või osaliselt ehitatud neurovõrgu arhitektuuride abil. Eesmärkidele orienteeritud närvivõrgu dialoogisüsteemi loomise oluline eeltingimus on andmekogum, mis esindab tüüpilisi dialoogistsenaariume ja sisaldab erinevaid semantilisi märkusi, nt kavatsusi, aegu ja dialoogi toiminguid, mis on vajalikud konkreetse närvivõrgu arhitektuuri koolitamiseks. Käesolevas demonstreerimisdokumendis tutvustame lihtsalt kasutatavat liidest ja selle taustaprogrammi, mis on suunatud valdkonna ekspertidele eesmärgipõhiste dialooginäidiste kogumiseks. Platvorm ei võimalda mitte ainult struktureeritud viisil koguda või kirjutada näidisdialooge, vaid pakub ka vahendeid dialoogide lihtsaks märgistamiseks ja tõlgendamiseks. Platvorm ise on keelesõltumatu; see sõltub ainult konkreetse keele töötlemise komponentide kättesaadavusest. Seda kasutatakse praegu läti keeles dialooginäidiste kogumiseks, mis kujutavad endast tüüpilist suhtlust üliõpilaste ja üliõpilasteenistuse vahel.', 'fi': 'Nykyään useimmat dialogijärjestelmät on rakennettu kokonaan tai osittain neuroverkkoarkkitehtuurin avulla. Keskeinen edellytys tavoitteellisen neuroverkkodialogijärjestelmän luomiselle on tietokokonaisuus, joka edustaa tyypillisiä dialogisuskenaarioita ja sisältää erilaisia semanttisia huomautuksia, kuten aikomuksia, aukkoja ja dialogitoimintoja, jotka ovat tarpeen tietyn neuroverkkoarkkitehtuurin kouluttamiseksi. Esittelyssä esitellään helppokäyttöinen käyttöliittymä ja sen taustaosa, joka on suunnattu alan asiantuntijoille tavoitteellisten dialoginäytteiden keräämiseksi. Alusta ei vain salli kerätä tai kirjoittaa esimerkkidialogeja jäsennellyllä tavalla, vaan tarjoaa myös mahdollisuuden yksinkertaista huomautuksia ja tulkintaa dialogeista. Alusta itsessään on kieliriippumaton; Se riippuu vain tiettyjen kieltenkäsittelykomponenttien saatavuudesta tietylle kielelle. Tällä hetkellä sitä käytetään Latvian (erittäin taipuvainen kieli) vuoropuhelunäytteiden keräämiseen, jotka edustavat tyypillistä opiskelijoiden ja opiskelijapalvelun välistä viestintää.', 'ca': "Avui dia, la majoria dels sistemes de diàleg estan construïts en totalitat o en part usant arquitectures de xarxa neural. A crucial prerequisite for the creation of a goal-oriented neural network dialogue system is a dataset that represents typical dialogue scenarios and includes various semantic annotations, e.g. intents, slots and dialogue actions, that are necessary for training a particular neural network architecture.  En aquest paper de demostració, presentem una interfície fàcil d'utilitzar i el seu final orientat a experts de domini per a recollir mostres de diàleg orientats cap als objectius. La plataforma no només permet recollir o escriure diàlegs de mostra d'una manera estructurada, sinó també proporciona un mitjà per a simple anotació i interpretació dels diàlegs. The platform itself is language-independent;  depèn només de la disponibilitat de components específics de processament de llenguatges per a un llenguatge específic. Actualment s'està utilitzant per recollir mostres de diàleg en lletó (una llengua altament influïda) que representen la típica comunicació entre estudiants i el servei d'estudiants.", 'ha': "A yau, mafi yawan zauren zauren akwatin bayani na cikakken ko rabo an gina su da tsarin tsarin jerin neura. Wani muhimu wa ƙiƙiro wani tsarin zauren akwatin bayani na tagan neural da ke gabatar da goani, yana da tsari na tsari wanda ke nuna bakin bayani na zauren akwatin bayani na daban-daban kuma yana ƙunsa da zane-zane masu motsi, misali, masu hankali, slot da aikin zauren akwatin bayani, da za'a buƙata don a yi amfani da wani bakan tsarin na jerin neural. Daga cikin wannan takardan nuna, Munã ƙayyade wani sauƙi da za'a yi amfani da fuskar kwamfyuta da ƙarshen bayani wanda aka yi wa juyi wa masu fitarwa na cikin shirin misãlai masu cikin shirin zauren akwatin goani. Fanel ba ya yarda kawai da za'a sami zauren akwatin misãlai ko kuma ya rubũta zauren akwatin bayani da aka saka, kuma amma yana da wani amfani da wa zane-zane da fassarar zauren akwatin bayanin. Fatforman da ke da shi yana da huru'a cikin harshe; tana dõgara kawai da ake samun ƙanshi na aikin aiki da ke ƙayyade cikin harshe na ƙayyade. Ana amfani da shi a samun zauren akwatin bayani na Latiya (harshen da aka yi wa hisãbi mai girma) wanda ke wakilisha koma mai kawaici tsakanin ardan da aikin karatun.", 'sk': 'Danes je večina dialognih sistemov v celoti ali delno zgrajenih z uporabo arhitekture nevronskih omrežij. Ključni predpogoj za ustvarjanje ciljno usmerjenega dialognega sistema nevronskega omrežja je nabor podatkov, ki predstavlja tipične dialogne scenarije in vključuje različne semantične opombe, npr. namene, reže in dialogne akcije, ki so potrebne za usposabljanje določene arhitekture nevronskega omrežja. V tem demonstracijskem prispevku predstavljamo enostaven za uporabo vmesnika in njegovo zalednico, ki je usmerjen v domenske strokovnjake za zbiranje ciljno usmerjenih dialognih vzorcev. Platforma ne omogoča le zbiranja ali pisanja vzorčnih dialogov na strukturiran način, temveč zagotavlja tudi sredstvo za preprosto označevanje in interpretacijo dialogov. platforma sama je jezikovno neodvisna; je odvisna samo od razpoložljivosti določenih jezikovnih komponent obdelave za določen jezik. Trenutno se uporablja za zbiranje vzorcev dialoga v latvijščini (zelo privlačen jezik), ki predstavljajo tipično komunikacijo med študenti in študentsko službo.', 'jv': 'Nyong, sistem dialog sing dibenakake duwé nggawe nguwe akeh-akeh nguwe Arkita Neral. Sampeyan akeh mi dianggap punika kanggo nggawe sistem dadi sing nduwih nggawe kno dadi sing dumateng un ciptaaken sing dipenerlo dialog sing dumateng un ciptaaken semantar In this displaation paper, we present an lakous to use interactive and the back-end that is Orientation to domain special for the sampling of goal-Orientation dialog samples. Laptop" and "Desktop Sapa-sistem sing kedhah basa kuwi nesalah-nesalah; ing Aku ngolesi iki dipunangé ngébutaké sampul éntuk ing pancen ning Latwih (langa sing luwih apik) sing ngubah penyanaké komunikasi babasane umuwig lan sak ujak-ujak.', 'bo': 'དེ་རིང་ལ། ཌའི་ལོག་རིམ་མང་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡིན་ནའང་མིའི་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་སྤྱོད A crucial prerequisite for the creation of a goal-oriented neural network dialog system is a dataset that represents typical dialog scenarios and includes various semantic annotations, e.g. intents, slots and dialog actions, that are necessary for training a particular neural network architecture. ང་ཚོས་འཆར་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་མཐུད་སྣེ་འདྲ་བ་དང་མཐའ་མཇུག་ལ་སྤྱོད་ཐབས་མེད་སླ་གཏོང་ཡོད། གླེང་སྒྲོམ་འདིས་བཟོ་བཀོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་དཔེ་གཏོང་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་ཚོགས་སྒྲིག་དང་འབྲི་བ་དགོས་མིན་པར་སྤྲོད་དགོས་པ་ལས་དབྱེ་ས གླེང་སྒྲོམ་འདི་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་སྐད་རིགས་རང་དབང་ཡིན་པ་རེད། སྐད་རིགས་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཤས་གཅིག་ལས་སྤྱོད་རུང་བར་གཏན་ཁེལ ད་ལྟ་བུའི་སྐད་ཡིག', 'he': 'היום, רוב מערכות דיאלוג בנויות לחלוטין או חלקית באמצעות ארכיטקטורות רשת עצבית. התנאי מראשי קריטי לייצור מערכת דיאלוג רשת עצבית ממוקדת למטרה הוא קבוצת נתונים שמייצגת תרחישים דיאלוגים טיפוסיים וכוללת הערות סמנטיות שונות, למשל כוונות, מקומות דיאלוגים ופעולות דיאלוגים, הנדרשים לאימון ארכיטקטורת רשת עצבית מסויימת. In this demonstration paper, we present an easy to use interface and its back-end which is oriented to domain experts for the collection of goal-oriented dialogue samples.  הפלטפורמה לא רק מאפשרת לאסוף או לכתוב דיאלוגים דגימות בדרך מבוססת, אלא גם מספקת אמצעים להציעה ופרשנות פשוטות של הדיולוגים. הפלטפורמה עצמה היא עצמית לשפה, זה תלוי רק בהזמינות של רכיבי עיבוד שפה מסויימים לשפה מסויימת. כרגע הוא משתמש באספת דגימות דיאלוג בלטבית (שפה מעורבת מאוד) שמייצגת תקשורת טיפוסית בין התלמידים לשירות התלמידים.'}
{'en': 'Which is Better for Deep Learning : Python or MATLAB? Answering Comparative Questions in Natural Language', 'ar': 'أيهما أفضل للتعلم العميق: Python أم MATLAB؟ الإجابة على أسئلة المقارنة بلغة طبيعية', 'es': '¿Qué es mejor para el aprendizaje profundo: Python o MATLAB? Respuesta a preguntas comparativas en lenguaje natural', 'pt': 'Qual é melhor para Deep Learning: Python ou MATLAB? Respondendo a perguntas comparativas em linguagem natural', 'fr': 'Quel est le meilleur pour le Deep Learning\xa0: Python ou MATLAB\xa0? Répondre à des questions comparatives en langage naturel', 'ja': 'どちらがディープラーニングに適していますか？ PythonまたはMATLABですか？自然言語での比較質問への回答', 'hi': 'डीप लर्निंग के लिए कौन सा बेहतर है: पायथन या MATLAB? प्राकृतिक भाषा में तुलनात्मक प्रश्नों के उत्तर देना', 'zh': '孰宜深学,Python与MATLAB? 以自然语言对校之', 'ru': 'Что лучше для глубокого обучения: Python или MATLAB? Ответы на сравнительные вопросы на естественном языке', 'ga': 'Cé acu is Fearr don Fhoghlaim Dhomhain: Python nó MATLAB? Ag Freagairt Ceisteanna Comparáideacha i dTeanga Nádúrtha', 'ka': 'რომელიც უკეთესია დიდი სწავლებისთვის: Python ან MATLAB? შესაბამისი კითხვების პარამეტრებით ნაირადი ენაში', 'el': 'Ποιο είναι καλύτερο για τη βαθιά μάθηση: Python ή MATLAB; Απάντηση σε συγκριτικές ερωτήσεις στη φυσική γλώσσα', 'hu': 'Melyik a jobb a Deep Learning számára: Python vagy MATLAB? Összehasonlító kérdések megválaszolása természetes nyelven', 'kk': 'Қалыпты оқу үшін қандай жақсы: Python не MATLAB? Қарастырмалы сұрақтарды табиғи тілде жауап беру', 'it': 'Qual è meglio per il Deep Learning: Python o MATLAB? Rispondere a domande comparative nel linguaggio naturale', 'lt': 'Which is Better for Deep Learning: Python or MATLAB?  Atsakymai į lyginamuosius klausimus natūralioje kalboje', 'ms': 'Which is Better for Deep Learning: Python or MATLAB?  Answering Comparative Questions in Natural Language', 'mt': 'Liema huwa Aħjar għal Tagħlim Profond: Python jew MATLAB? Tweġiba għal mistoqsijiet komparattivi fil-lingwa naturali', 'mn': 'Гүн гүнзгий суралцах нь юу вэ? Python эсвэл MATLAB? Байгалийн хэл дээр харьцуулсан асуултуудын хариулт', 'no': 'Kva er bedre for dypt læring: Python eller MATLAB? Svar samanlikne spørsmål i naturspråk', 'mk': 'Which is Better for Deep Learning: Python or MATLAB?  Одговарање на споредливи прашања на природниот јазик', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തെ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന് ഏതാണ് നല്ലത്: പൈത്തോണോ MATLAB? സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയിലുള്ള ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നു', 'pl': 'Co jest lepsze dla Deep Learning: Python czy MATLAB? Odpowiedzi na pytania porównawcze w języku naturalnym', 'ro': 'Care este mai bine pentru Deep Learning: Python sau MATLAB? Răspunsul la întrebări comparative în limbajul natural', 'so': "Yaa ka wanaagsan waxbarashada mool dheer: Python ama MATLAB? Jawaabta su'aalaha isbarbardhigga afka asalka ah", 'sv': 'Vilket är bättre för Deep Learning: Python eller MATLAB? Svara på jämförande frågor i naturligt språk', 'ta': 'ஆழமான கற்றத்திற்கு எந்த சிறந்தது: பைதான் அல்லது MATLAB? இயல்பான மொழியில் ஒப்பிடும் கேள்விகளுக்கு பதில்', 'si': 'මොකක්ද ගොඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්නේ: Python නැත්තම් MATLAB? ප්\u200dරාකෘතික භාෂාවට සමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න උත්තර දෙන්න', 'sr': 'Što je bolje za duboko učenje: Python ili MATLAB? Odgovor usporednih pitanja na prirodnom jeziku', 'ur': 'عمیق تعلیم کے لئے کون بہتر ہے: Python یا MATLAB؟ طبیعی زبان میں مقابلہ سوال جواب دیتے ہیں', 'uz': "Ko\xa0ªp o'rganish uchun nima —è—Ö—à–∏—Ä–æ“õ–¥–∏—Ä: Python yoki MATLAB? Ta\xa0ºminlovchi so\xa0ªrovlar javob beradi", 'vi': 'Cái nào tốt hơn cho việc học sâu: Python hay MATTB? Trả lời Câu hỏi tỉ mỉ về ngôn ngữ tự nhiên', 'da': 'Hvad er bedre for Deep Learning: Python eller MATLAB? Besvarelse af sammenlignende spørgsmål i naturligt sprog', 'bg': 'Кое е по-добро за дълбоко обучение: Питон или МАТЛАБ? Отговаряне на сравнителни въпроси по естествен език', 'nl': 'Wat is Beter voor Deep Learning: Python of MATLAB? Vergelijkende vragen beantwoorden in de natuurlijke taal', 'hr': 'Što je bolje za duboko učenje: Python ili MATLAB? Odgovor usporednih pitanja na prirodnom jeziku', 'de': 'Was ist besser für Deep Learning: Python oder MATLAB? Vergleichende Fragen in natürlicher Sprache beantworten', 'id': 'Yang lebih baik untuk belajar dalam: Python atau MATLAB? Jawab Pertanyaan Paling Dalam Bahasa Alami', 'ko': '파이톤과 매틀랩 중 어느 것이 심도 있는 학습에 더 적합합니까?자연어로 비교 문제를 대답하다', 'fa': 'چه چیزی برای یادگیری عمیق بهتر است: پیتان یا MATLAB؟ جواب سوالات مقایسه در زبان طبیعی', 'tr': 'Derrew öwrenmek üçin haýsy gowydyr: Python ýa-da MATLAB? Taryh dilde Seresasy Soraglary jogap bermek üçin', 'sw': 'Ni lipi bora kwa ajili ya kujifunza kwa kina: Python au MATLAB? Jibu maswali yanayolinganisha kwa lugha ya asili', 'af': 'Wat is beter vir Deep Leer: Python of MATLAB? Antwoord vergelyklike vrae in Natuurlike Taal', 'am': 'ለጥልቅ ትምህርት ማን ይሻላል? Python ወይስ MATLAB? ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Derin öyrənmək üçün hansı daha yaxşıdır: Python və ya MATLAB? Təbiətli dildə müqayisədə sualları cavab vermək', 'bn': 'গভীর শিক্ষার জন্য কি ভালো: পাইথন নাকি ম্যাট্লাব? স্বাভাবিক ভাষায় তুলনায় প্রশ্নের উত্তর', 'bs': 'Što je bolje za duboko učenje: Python ili MATLAB? Odgovor usporednih pitanja na prirodnom jeziku', 'cs': 'Co je lepší pro hluboké učení: Python nebo MATLAB? Zodpovězení srovnávacích otázek v přirozeném jazyce', 'et': 'Milline on parem sügavõppe jaoks: Python või MATLAB? Vastamine võrdlevatele küsimustele looduslikus keeles', 'sq': 'Cili është më i mirë për mësimin e thellë: Python apo MATLAB? Përgjigje pyetjeve krahasuese në gjuhën natyrore', 'fi': 'Mikä on parempi Deep Learning: Python vai MATLAB? Vastaaminen vertaileviin kysymyksiin luonnollisella kielellä', 'hy': 'Which is Better for Deep Learning: Python or MATLAB?  Պատասխանը բնական լեզվով համեմատական հարցերին', 'ca': 'Which is Better for Deep Learning: Python or MATLAB?  Respondent a preguntes comparatives en llenguatge natural', 'ha': '@ item: inmenu Text Completion @ action', 'sk': 'Kaj je boljše za globoko učenje: Python ali MATLAB? Odgovori na primerjalna vprašanja v naravnem jeziku', 'bo': 'སྦྱོར་བའི་ཤེས་ཚད་ལ་དགའ་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནམ། Python ཡང་ན་ MATLAB་ཡིན་ནམ། རྨན་ཅུང་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་ནང་ལ་བཟོ་བཅུས་བའི་དྲི་ཚིག་ལན་པ', 'jv': 'deep Inggal Régal Galing kanggo langgambar anyar', 'he': 'מה שעדיף ללמוד עמוק: פיתון או MATLAB? עונה לשאלות משוואות בשפה טבעית'}
{'en': 'We present a system for answering comparative questions (Is X better than Y with respect to Z?) in natural language. Answering such questions is important for assisting humans in making informed decisions. The key component of our system is a natural language interface for comparative QA that can be used in personal assistants, chatbots, and similar NLP devices. Comparative QA is a challenging NLP task, since it requires collecting support evidence from many different sources, and direct comparisons of rare objects may be not available even on the entire Web. We take the first step towards a solution for such a task offering a testbed for comparative QA in natural language by probing several methods, making the three best ones available as an online demo.', 'es': 'Presentamos un sistema para responder preguntas comparativas (¿X es mejor que Y con respecto a Z?) en lenguaje natural. Responder a estas preguntas es importante para ayudar a los humanos a tomar decisiones informadas. El componente clave de nuestro sistema es una interfaz de lenguaje natural para el control de calidad comparativo que se puede utilizar en asistentes personales, chatbots y dispositivos de PNL similares. El control de calidad comparativo es una tarea desafiante de la PNL, ya que requiere recopilar evidencia de apoyo de muchas fuentes diferentes, y las comparaciones directas de objetos raros pueden no estar disponibles ni siquiera en toda la Web. Damos el primer paso hacia una solución para tal tarea ofreciendo un banco de pruebas para el control de calidad comparativo en lenguaje natural mediante el sondeo de varios métodos, haciendo que los tres mejores estén disponibles como demostración en línea.', 'ar': 'نقدم نظامًا للإجابة على الأسئلة المقارنة (هل X أفضل من Y بالنسبة إلى Z؟) بلغة طبيعية. الإجابة على مثل هذه الأسئلة مهمة لمساعدة البشر في اتخاذ قرارات مستنيرة. المكون الرئيسي لنظامنا هو واجهة اللغة الطبيعية لضمان الجودة المقارنة التي يمكن استخدامها في المساعدين الشخصيين وروبوتات المحادثة وأجهزة البرمجة اللغوية العصبية المماثلة. تعد ضمان الجودة المقارن مهمة صعبة في معالجة اللغات الطبيعية ، لأنها تتطلب جمع أدلة الدعم من العديد من المصادر المختلفة ، وقد لا تتوفر المقارنات المباشرة للكائنات النادرة حتى على شبكة الويب بأكملها. نتخذ الخطوة الأولى نحو حل لمثل هذه المهمة ، حيث نقدم اختبارًا لمقارنة ضمان الجودة في اللغة الطبيعية من خلال التحقق من عدة طرق ، مما يجعل أفضلها متاحًا كعرض تجريبي عبر الإنترنت.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos um sistema para responder questões comparativas (X é melhor que Y em relação a Z?) em linguagem natural. Responder a essas perguntas é importante para ajudar os humanos a tomar decisões informadas. O principal componente do nosso sistema é uma interface de linguagem natural para controle de qualidade comparativo que pode ser usada em assistentes pessoais, chatbots e dispositivos de PNL semelhantes. O QA comparativo é uma tarefa desafiadora da PNL, pois requer a coleta de evidências de suporte de muitas fontes diferentes, e comparações diretas de objetos raros podem não estar disponíveis mesmo em toda a Web. Damos o primeiro passo em direção a uma solução para tal tarefa, oferecendo um banco de testes para QA comparativo em linguagem natural, testando vários métodos, disponibilizando os três melhores como uma demonstração online.', 'ja': '自然言語での比較質問（ Zに関してXはYより優れているか？ ）に答えるためのシステムを提示します。このような質問に答えることは、人間が情報に基づいた意思決定を行うのを支援するために重要です。当社システムの重要なコンポーネントは、パーソナルアシスタント、チャットボット、および類似のNLPデバイスで使用できる比較QAのための自然言語インターフェースです。比較QAは、多くの異なるソースからのサポートエビデンスを収集する必要があるため、NLPタスクでは困難であり、レアなオブジェクトの直接比較は、ウェブ全体でさえ利用できない可能性があります。私たちは、いくつかの方法を調査し、3つの最良の方法をオンラインデモとして利用できるようにすることによって、自然言語の比較QAのテストベースを提供するこのようなタスクのソリューションへの最初のステップを踏みます。', 'fr': "Nous présentons un système pour répondre à des questions comparatives (X est-il meilleur que Y par rapport à Z\xa0?) en langage naturel. Il est important de répondre à de telles questions pour aider les humains à prendre des décisions éclairées. Le composant clé de notre système est une interface en langage naturel pour l'assurance qualité comparative qui peut être utilisée dans les assistants personnels, les chatbots et les appareils similaires de PNL. L'assurance qualité comparative est une tâche de PNL difficile, car elle nécessite de recueillir des preuves à l'appui de nombreuses sources différentes, et les comparaisons directes d'objets rares peuvent ne pas être disponibles, même sur l'ensemble du Web. Nous faisons le premier pas vers une solution pour une telle tâche en offrant un banc d'essai pour l'assurance qualité comparative en langage naturel en explorant plusieurs méthodes, en rendant les trois meilleures disponibles sous forme de démonstration en ligne.", 'ru': 'Мы представляем систему ответов на сравнительные вопросы (Является ли X лучше, чем Y по отношению к Z?) на естественном языке. Ответы на такие вопросы важны для оказания людям помощи в принятии обоснованных решений. Ключевым компонентом нашей системы является естественный языковой интерфейс для сравнительного контроля качества, который может быть использован в персональных помощниках, чат-ботах и аналогичных NLP-устройствах. Сравнительное обеспечение качества - сложная задача NLP, поскольку она требует сбора подтверждающих доказательств из множества различных источников, а прямые сравнения редких объектов могут быть недоступны даже во всей сети. Мы делаем первый шаг к решению такой задачи, предлагая тестовый стенд для сравнительного контроля качества на естественном языке, изучая несколько методов, делая три лучших из них доступными в виде онлайн-демонстрации.', 'hi': 'हम प्राकृतिक भाषा में तुलनात्मक प्रश्नों के उत्तर देने के लिए एक प्रणाली प्रस्तुत करते हैं (क्या X Z के संबंध में Y से बेहतर है?) ऐसे सवालों के जवाब देना मनुष्यों को सूचित निर्णय लेने में मदद करने के लिए महत्वपूर्ण है। हमारे सिस्टम का प्रमुख घटक तुलनात्मक क्यूए के लिए एक प्राकृतिक भाषा इंटरफ़ेस है जिसका उपयोग व्यक्तिगत सहायकों, चैटबॉट्स और इसी तरह के एनएलपी उपकरणों में किया जा सकता है। तुलनात्मक क्यूए एक चुनौतीपूर्ण एनएलपी कार्य है, क्योंकि इसके लिए कई अलग-अलग स्रोतों से समर्थन साक्ष्य एकत्र करने की आवश्यकता होती है, और दुर्लभ वस्तुओं की सीधी तुलना पूरे वेब पर भी उपलब्ध नहीं हो सकती है। हम इस तरह के एक कार्य के लिए एक समाधान की दिशा में पहला कदम उठाते हैं जो कई तरीकों की जांच करके प्राकृतिक भाषा में तुलनात्मक क्यूए के लिए एक टेस्टबेड की पेशकश करता है, जिससे तीन सर्वश्रेष्ठ लोग ऑनलाइन डेमो के रूप में उपलब्ध होते हैं।', 'zh': '建一统,以对自然语言之问(则Z而言之,X贤于Y乎?)。 曰:明甚于助人。 吾之统要组件所以较QA之自然语言界面,施于人助理,聊天机器人类之NLP备也。 校 QA 一挑战性之 NLP 务,以其多端收证,虽一 Web 之中,亦或无所得也。 吾等出此解决方案第一,探数术,较自然语言QA试平台,使三者为在线演。', 'ga': 'Cuirimid córas i láthair chun ceisteanna comparáideacha a fhreagairt (An bhfuil X níos fearr ná Y maidir le Z?) i dteanga nádúrtha. Tá sé tábhachtach ceisteanna dá leithéid a fhreagairt chun cabhrú le daoine cinntí eolasacha a dhéanamh. Is é príomh-chomhpháirt ár gcóras comhéadan teanga nádúrtha le haghaidh QA comparáideach ar féidir a úsáid i gcúntóirí pearsanta, chatbots, agus gléasanna NLP dá samhail. Is tasc dúshlánach NLP é QA Comparáideach, toisc go bhfuil gá le fianaise tacaíochta a bhailiú ó go leor foinsí éagsúla, agus d’fhéadfadh sé nach mbeadh comparáidí díreacha ar réada neamhchoitianta ar fáil fiú ar an nGréasán iomlán. Glacaimid an chéad chéim i dtreo réiteach a fháil ar thasc den sórt sin, leaba tástála a thairiscint le haghaidh QA comparáideach i dteanga nádúrtha trí roinnt modhanna a fhiosrú, ag cur na trí cinn is fearr ar fáil mar thaispeántas ar líne.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα σύστημα για την απάντηση συγκριτικών ερωτήσεων (Είναι το Χ καλύτερο από το Υ σε σχέση με το Ζ;) στη φυσική γλώσσα. Η απάντηση σε τέτοιες ερωτήσεις είναι σημαντική για να βοηθήσει τους ανθρώπους να λαμβάνουν ενημερωμένες αποφάσεις. Το βασικό στοιχείο του συστήματός μας είναι μια διεπαφή φυσικής γλώσσας για συγκριτική αξιολόγηση που μπορεί να χρησιμοποιηθεί σε προσωπικούς βοηθούς, και παρόμοιες συσκευές. Η συγκριτική QA είναι ένα δύσκολο έργο, δεδομένου ότι απαιτεί τη συλλογή στοιχείων υποστήριξης από πολλές διαφορετικές πηγές, και οι άμεσες συγκρίσεις σπάνιων αντικειμένων μπορεί να μην είναι διαθέσιμες ακόμη και σε ολόκληρο το διαδίκτυο. Κάνουμε το πρώτο βήμα προς μια λύση για μια τέτοια εργασία προσφέροντας ένα δοκιμαστικό πεδίο για συγκριτική QA στη φυσική γλώσσα εξετάζοντας διάφορες μεθόδους, καθιστώντας τις τρεις καλύτερες διαθέσιμες ως διαδικτυακή επίδειξη.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ გაჩვენებთ სისტემის შესაბამისი კითხვების პასუხისთვის (X უკეთესია Y უკეთესია Z-ზე?) თავისუფალური ენაში. ასეთი კითხვების გარეშე მნიშვნელოვანია ადამიანების დახმარებისთვის ინფორმაციული განსაზღვრებისთვის. ჩვენი სისტემის გასაკუთარი კომპონენტი არის ნაირთი ენის ინტერფექტი, რომელიც შეიძლება გამოიყენება პირადგილური asistenტებში, სატუბოტებში და სხვადასხვა NLP მოწყო QA-ს შესაბამისი შესაბამისი NLP დავალება, რადგან ის უნდა მსგავსი განსხვავებული წიგნიდან დაიყენოთ დამხმარებელი წიგნის შესაბამისი შესაბამისი განსხვავებული წიგნიდან და რეტურ ჩვენ პირველი ნაწილის გადავიწყებთ ამ რაოდენობის პარამეტრებისთვის, რომელიც QA-ს შემდგომარებისთვის თავისუფალური ენაში მოვიწყებთ, რამდენიმე მეტედისთვის, რომელიც სამი', 'it': "Presentiamo un sistema per rispondere a domande comparative (X è meglio di Y rispetto a Z?) in linguaggio naturale. Rispondere a tali domande è importante per aiutare gli esseri umani a prendere decisioni informate. La componente chiave del nostro sistema è un'interfaccia di linguaggio naturale per il QA comparativo che può essere utilizzata in assistenti personali, chatbot e dispositivi NLP simili. La QA comparativa è un compito impegnativo di PNL, poiché richiede la raccolta di prove di supporto da molte fonti diverse, e i confronti diretti di oggetti rari potrebbero non essere disponibili anche su tutto il Web. Facciamo il primo passo verso una soluzione per questo compito offrendo un banco di prova per il QA comparativo in linguaggio naturale sondando diversi metodi, rendendo disponibili i tre migliori come demo online.", 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk az összehasonlító kérdések megválaszolására szolgáló rendszert (X jobb, mint Y, Z-vel szemben?) természetes nyelven. Az ilyen kérdések megválaszolása fontos ahhoz, hogy segítséget nyújtson az embereknek a megalapozott döntések meghozatalában. Rendszerünk kulcsfontosságú összetevője egy természetes nyelvi felület az összehasonlító minőségbiztosításhoz, amely személyi asszisztensekben, chatbotokban és hasonló NLP eszközökben használható. Az összehasonlító minőségbiztosítás kihívást jelent az NLP feladat, mivel számos különböző forrásból származó támogatási bizonyítékok gyűjtésére van szükség, és előfordulhat, hogy a ritka objektumok közvetlen összehasonlítása még az egész interneten sem érhető el. Az első lépést megtesszük egy ilyen feladat megoldása felé, amely tesztágyat kínál a természetes nyelvű összehasonlító minőségbiztosításhoz, több módszert vizsgálva, a három legjobb online demó formájában elérhetővé téve.', 'kk': 'Біз салыстырмалы сұрақтарды жауап беру жүйесін келтіреміз (X Z-ден жақсы ба?) табиғи тілде. Бұл сұрақтарды жауап беру адамдарға мәліметті шешімдеу үшін көмектесу үшін маңызды. Жүйеңіздің кілт компоненті - жеке көмекшілер, шатботтар және ұқсас NLP құрылғыларында қолданылатын QA- тың негізгі тіл интерфейсі. QA сәйкестік - NLP тапсырмасы, өйткені ол көптеген көптеген көптеген қолдау мәліметтерін жинау керек, және қарапайым нысандарды тікелей салыстыру мүмкін, толық Вебде де қолдан Біз бұл тапсырма үшін бірінші қадамды тапсырманың түсінікті QA тілдегі салыстырмалы тілде тестіру үшін бірнеше әдістерді тексеріп, онлайн демократия ретінде үш ең жақсы демократиял', 'mk': 'Презентираме систем за одговори на споредливи прашања (Дали е X подобро од Y во однос на Z?) на природен јазик. Одговорите на вакви прашања се важни за помошта на луѓето во донесувањето информирани одлуки. The key component of our system is a natural language interface for comparative QA that can be used in personal assistants, chatbots, and similar NLP devices.  Comparative QA is a challenging NLP task, since it requires collecting support evidence from many different sources, and direct comparisons of rare objects may be not available even on the entire Web.  We take the first step towards a solution for such a task offering a testbed for comparative QA in natural language by probing several methods, making the three best ones available as an online demo.', 'lt': 'Pateikiame palyginamųjų klausimų atsakymo sistemą (ar X yra geresnis nei Y Z atžvilgiu?) in natural language.  Atsakymai į tokius klausimus yra svarbūs siekiant padėti žmonėms priimti pagrįstus sprendimus. Pagrindinis mūsų sistemos komponentas yra natūrali lyginamojo QA kalbų sąsaja, kuri gali būti naudojama asmeniniams padėjėjams, chatbotams ir panašiems NLP prietaisams. Palyginamoji kokybė yra sunki NLP užduotis, nes ji reikalauja surinkti paramos įrodymus iš daugelio skirtingų šaltinių, o tiesioginio retų objektų palyginimo netgi visame internete nėra. Pirmą žingsnį siekiame tokios užduoties sprendimo, kuriame būtų galima rasti lyginamąjį QA natūralioje kalboje bandomąjį pagrindą, išbandydami kelis metodus, kad trys geriausi būtų prieinami kaip internetinė demonstracija.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan sistem untuk menjawab soalan perbandingan (Adakah X lebih baik daripada Y terhadap Z?) dalam bahasa semulajadi. Jawaban soalan seperti itu penting untuk membantu manusia dalam membuat keputusan yang diberitahu. Komponen kunci sistem kita adalah antaramuka bahasa biasa untuk QA perbandingan yang boleh digunakan dalam pembantu peribadi, chatbot, dan peranti NLP yang sama. QA perbandingan adalah tugas NLP yang mencabar, kerana ia memerlukan mengumpulkan bukti sokongan dari banyak sumber yang berbeza, dan perbandingan langsung objek langka mungkin tidak tersedia walaupun di seluruh Web. Kami mengambil langkah pertama ke arah penyelesaian untuk tugas seperti itu menawarkan tempat ujian untuk QA perbandingan dalam bahasa semulajadi dengan menguji beberapa kaedah, membuat tiga yang terbaik tersedia sebagai demo online.', 'ml': 'ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിനായി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സിസ്റ്റത്തെ കാണിക്കുന്നു (Z നെക്കാള്\u200d X നല്ലതാണോ? സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയില്\u200d. ഇത്തരം ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നത് വിവരമറിയിക്കുന്ന തീരുമാനത്തില്\u200d മനുഷ്യരെ സഹായിക്കാ നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ താക്കോല്\u200d ഘടകങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ വിനിമയതലയാണ്. അത് വ്യക്തിപരമായ സഹായികള്\u200d, ചട്ട്ബോട്ടുകള്\u200d, പോല താല്\u200dക്കാലികമായ ക്യൂഎ എംഎല്\u200dപി ജോലിയാണ് വ്യത്യസ്ത ഉറവിടങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന തെളിവുകള്\u200d സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുന്നത്. ചുരുക സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയിലേക്ക് താല്\u200dപ്പര്യമുള്ള ഒരു ജോലിയുടെ പരിശോധനത്തിന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെ പടിയിലേക്ക് എടുക്കുന്നു. പല രീതികള്\u200d പരിശോധി', 'mn': 'Бид харьцуулсан асуултуудыг хариулах системийг үзүүлье (X Z-с илүү үү үү?) байгалийн хэл дээр. Ийм асуултуудыг хариулах нь хүмүүст мэдээллийн шийдвэр гаргах тулд чухал. Бидний системийн түлхүүр компонент бол хувийн тусламжтайгаар, шатбот болон төстэй NLP төхөөрөмжүүд дээр хэрэглэгдэж болох байгалийн хэл интерфейс юм. QA-г харьцуулах нь NLP-ын төвөгтэй ажил юм. Учир нь энэ нь олон өөр эх үүсвэрээс дэмжлэх баталгааг цуглуулах шаардлагатай ба ховор объектүүдийн шууд харьцуулах нь бүх Веб дээр ч байж болохгүй. Бид үүний шийдвэр руу анхны алхам нь байгалийн хэл дээр QA-г харьцуулахын тулд, олон аргаар судалж, онлайн демократийн хувьд 3 сайн арга барилгыг ашиглаж байна.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer eit system for å svara på sammenlignbare spørsmål (Er X bedre enn Y med respekt til Z?) i naturspråk. Svar på slike spørsmål er viktig for å hjelpa mennesker i å gjera informarte beslutningar. Nøkkelkomponenten av systemet vårt er eit naturleg språk- grensesnitt for sammenlignbare QA som kan brukast i personleg assistent, pratbots og liknande NLP- einingar. Relativ QA er eit vanskeleg NLP-oppgåve, sidan det krev å samla støtte-beviser frå mange ulike kjelder, og direkte sammenligningar av rare objekt kan ikkje vera tilgjengelege sjølv på heile nettet. Vi tar den første stegen mot eit løysing for slike oppgåve som tilbyr ein testtestbed for sammenlignbare QA i naturspråk ved å prøve fleire metodar, og gjer dei tre beste tilgjengelege som eit internett demo.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy system odpowiedzi na pytania porównawcze (Czy X jest lepszy od Y w odniesieniu do Z?) w języku naturalnym. Odpowiedź na takie pytania jest ważna dla pomocy ludziom w podejmowaniu świadomych decyzji. Kluczowym elementem naszego systemu jest naturalny interfejs językowy do porównawczej jakości, który może być wykorzystywany w osobistych asystentach, chatbotach i podobnych urządzeniach NLP. Porównawcza jakość jakości jest trudnym zadaniem NLP, ponieważ wymaga gromadzenia dowodów wsparcia z wielu różnych źródeł, a bezpośrednie porównania rzadkich obiektów mogą nie być dostępne nawet w całej sieci Web. Pierwszy krok w kierunku rozwiązania takiego zadania robimy oferując testy porównawczej jakości w języku naturalnym, badając kilka metod, dzięki czemu trzy najlepsze są dostępne jako demo online.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo sistem za odgovor na komparativna pitanja (Je li X bolji od Y u odnosu na Z?) na prirodnom jeziku. Odgovor na takva pitanja je važno za pomoć ljudima u donošenju informativnih odluka. Ključni komponent našeg sistema je prirodna jezička interfejsa za usporedbnu QA koja se može koristiti u ličnim asistentima, šatovima i sličnim NLP uređajima. Prepoređeni QA je izazovni zadatak NLP-a, jer zahteva skupljanje dokaza podrške iz mnogih različitih izvora, a direktne usporedbe rijetkih objekata možda nisu dostupne čak i na cijeloj mreži. Prvi korak prema rješenju takvog zadatka nudimo testovanje za usporedbenu QA na prirodnom jeziku probajući nekoliko metoda, čineći tri najbolje dostupne kao online demo.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw sistema għat-tweġiba għal mistoqsijiet komparattivi (X huwa a ħjar minn Y fir-rigward ta’ Z?) bil-lingwa naturali. It-tweġiba għal mistoqsijiet bħal dawn hija importanti biex tgħin lill-bnedmin jieħdu deċiżjonijiet infurmati. Il-komponent ewlieni tas-sistema tagħna huwa interfaċċja lingwistika naturali għal QA komparattiva li tista’ tintuża f’assistenti personali, chatbots, u apparati simili NLP. QA komparattiva hija kompitu ta’ sfida għall-NLP, billi teħtieġ il-ġbir ta’ evidenza ta’ appoġġ minn ħafna sorsi differenti, u tqabbil dirett ta’ oġġetti rari jista’ ma jkunx disponibbli anke fuq l-Internet kollu. Aħna nieħdu l-ewwel pass lejn soluzzjoni għal kompitu bħal dan li joffri bażi għall-ittestjar għal QA komparattiva fil-lingwa naturali billi nistudjaw diversi metodi, u nagħmlu disponibbli t-tliet l-a ħjar metodi bħala demostrazzjoni onlajn.', 'so': "Waxaynu keennaa nidaam ka jawaabaya su'aalaha isbarbardhigga (X ma ka wanaagsan tahay Y ee ka fiican Z?) luqada asalka ah Jawaabta su'aalahan waa muhiim in lagu caawiyo dadka go'aanka ogeysiisa. Kooxa muhiimka ah ee nidaamkayaga waa Interfac afka dabiiciga ah oo la barbaran karo QA oo lagu isticmaali karo caawiyayaasha shakhsiga ah, chatbots iyo qalabka u eg NLP. QA is a tacliin shaqada NLP, sababtoo ah waxay u baahan tahay in laga soo ururiyo calaamad taageero ah oo laga soo saaray sourceo badan, isla markaasna si toos ah isbardhigyada alaabta qaaliga ah laga heli karo xataa shabakadda oo dhan. Waxaynu u qaadannaa xafiiska ugu horeysa ee shaqada, kaas oo loo diyaariyo imtixaan oo la barbarbarto luqada dabiicadda ah ee QA, si a an u caddeyno qaabab badan, oo saddexda ugu wanaagsanaan sida demo internetka ah looga helo.", 'ro': 'Prezentăm un sistem de răspuns la întrebări comparative (Este X mai bun decât Y în raport cu Z?) în limbajul natural. Răspunsul la astfel de întrebări este important pentru a ajuta oamenii să ia decizii informate. Componenta cheie a sistemului nostru este o interfață de limbaj natural pentru QA comparativ, care poate fi utilizată în asistenți personali, chatbots și dispozitive similare NLP. QA comparată este o sarcină dificilă NLP, deoarece necesită colectarea dovezilor de sprijin din mai multe surse diferite, iar comparațiile directe ale obiectelor rare pot să nu fie disponibile chiar și pe întregul Web. Facem primul pas spre o soluție pentru o astfel de sarcină oferind un pat de testare pentru QA comparativ în limbaj natural prin sondarea mai multor metode, făcând cele mai bune trei disponibile ca un demo online.', 'ta': 'We present a system for answering comparative questions (Is X better than Y with respect to Z?)  இயல்பான மொழியில். இவ்வாறு கேள்விகளுக்கு பதில் அறிவிப்பு முடிவுகளை எடுத்து மனிதர்களுக்கு உதவுவது மிகவும் முக்கி எங்கள் கணினியின் முக்கிய பொருள் ஒரு இயல்பான மொழி இடைமுகப்பாகும். அது தனிப்பட்ட உதவிகள், chatbots மற்றும் அதே போன்ற NLP சாதனங்களில் பயன்படு ஒப்பிடும் QA ஒரு சவால் NLP பணியாகும், ஏனெனில் அது பல மூலங்களிலிருந்து ஆதரவு ஆதரவு தேவைப்படுகிறது, மற்றும் சிறிய பொருட்களின் நேரான ஒப்ப நாம் முதல் படி எடுத்துக் கொண்டு ஒரு செயல் தீர்வுக்காக ஒரு சோதனைப்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளோம் கியாவை ஒப்பீடு மொழியில் ஒப்பிடுவதற்கு, பல ம', 'si': 'අපි පද්ධතියක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරන්න (X වඩා Z වඩා හොඳයි කියලා?) ස්වාභාවික භාෂාවේ. මිනිස්සුන්ට තීරණ ගන්න උදව් කරන්න වැදගත් ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. අපේ පද්ධතියේ යතුරු භාෂාව සම්බන්ධයක් තමයි පෞද්ගලික උදව්වක, චැට්බෝට් සහ වගේ NLP උපකරණය සඳහා භාවිත කරන්න Comparison QA is a challenging NLP job, as it needed to collect backing සාක්ෂිපත්ත වෙනස් ප්\u200dරධානයෙන් සම්බන්ධ සාක්ෂිපත්ත සම්බන්ධයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න, and strait අපි මුලින්ම පැත්තක් අරගෙන යන්නේ ඒ වගේ වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන් පරීක්ෂණයක් දෙන්නේ QA සඳහා ස්වාභාවික භාෂාවට පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න,', 'ur': 'ہم ایک سیسٹم کی جواب دینے کے لئے مقایسات سوال کے لئے پیش کرتے ہیں (کیا X اس سے زیادہ بہتر ہے؟) طبیعی زبان میں۔ ایسے سوال کا جواب دینا لوگوں کی مدد کرنے کے لئے اہم ہے۔ ہمارے سیسٹم کی کلیدی رقم ایک طبیعی زبان انٹرنیفس ہے جو QA کے مقابلہ میں استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں وہی شخصی مددگار، چاٹبوٹ، اور جیسے NLP دستگاه میں استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں. مقابلہ QA ایک مشکل NLP کا کام ہے، کیونکہ اس کے لئے بہت سی مختلف سراسروں سے مدد جمع کرنے کی ضرورت ہے، اور بہت سی مشکل موجودات کا مستقیم مقابلہ بھی تمام ویب پر بھی موجود نہیں ہو سکتا۔ ہم اس طرح کے کام کے لئے پہلی قدم کو ایک حل کی طرف لے جاتے ہیں جو QA کے مقابلہ کے لئے طبیعی زبان میں آزمائش کے لئے آزمائش کی جاتی ہے، بہت سی طریقے کی آزمائش کے ذریعہ، تین بہترین طریقے کو آنلاین دیمو کے طور پر موجود', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar ett system för att besvara jämförande frågor (Är X bättre än Y med avseende på Z?) i naturligt språk. Att svara på sådana frågor är viktigt för att hjälpa människor att fatta välgrundade beslut. Den viktigaste komponenten i vårt system är ett naturligt språkgränssnitt för jämförande QA som kan användas i personliga assistenter, chattrobotar och liknande NLP-enheter. Jämförande QA är en utmanande NLP-uppgift, eftersom det kräver insamling av stödbevis från många olika källor, och direkta jämförelser av sällsynta föremål kanske inte är tillgängliga ens på hela webben. Vi tar det första steget mot en lösning för en sådan uppgift som erbjuder en testbädd för jämförande QA i naturligt språk genom att testa flera metoder, göra de tre bästa tillgängliga som en online demo.', 'uz': "We present a system for answering comparative questions (Is X better than Y with respect to Z?)  tabiiy tilda. Bu savollarni javob berish odamlarni yordam qilish muhim. Bizning tizimning kaliti komponenti oddiy tilning tarkibi interfeysi, shaxsiy yordamchilar, chatbotlar va huddi NLP uskunalarga ishlatiladi. @ info Biz bu vazifaning birinchi qadamni o'zgartiraymiz, biz ko'pchilik usullarni o'rganish uchun QA ta'minlovchi tizimni o'rganamiz, biz uchta ta ta'limni online demo sifatida saqlash mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một hệ thống trả lời các câu hỏi tương đối (X tốt hơn Y so với Z/ bằng ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Trả lời những câu hỏi đó rất quan trọng để giúp con người đưa ra quyết định thông tin. Thành phần chủ yếu của hệ thống là giao diện ngôn ngữ tự nhiên cho QA tương ứng mà có thể sử dụng cho trợ lý cá nhân, Chatur và những thiết bị gỗm. Đối tượng QA là một thử thách, vì nó cần phải thu thập chứng cứ hỗ trợ từ nhiều nguồn khác nhau, và nếu so sánh trực tiếp với những vật hiếm có lẽ thậm chí không thể tồn tại trên toàn mạng. Chúng tôi bước đầu tiên đến một giải pháp cho một nhiệm vụ như thế này, cung cấp thử nghiệm cho QA tương ứng trong ngôn ngữ tự nhiên bằng cách thăm dò vài phương pháp, làm cho ba loại tốt nhất có thể làm bộc phá trên mạng.', 'bg': 'Представяме система за отговор на сравнителни въпроси (По-добре ли е Х от Y по отношение на Z?) на естествен език. Отговарянето на такива въпроси е важно за подпомагане на хората при вземането на информирани решения. Ключовият компонент на нашата система е естествен езиков интерфейс за сравнително качество, който може да се използва в лични асистенти, чатботи и подобни устройства. Сравнителното качество е предизвикателна задача за НЛП, тъй като изисква събиране на доказателства за подкрепа от много различни източници, а директните сравнения на редки обекти може да не са налични дори в цялата уеб мрежа. Ние правим първата стъпка към решение за подобна задача, предлагайки тест за сравнително качество на естествения език, като изследваме няколко метода, като правим трите най-добри достъпни като онлайн демо.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo sustav za odgovor na usporedbene pitanja (Je li X bolji od Y u odnosu na Z?) na prirodnom jeziku. Odgovor na takva pitanja je važno za pomoć ljudima u donošenju informiranih odluka. Ključna komponenta našeg sustava je prirodna jezička interfejsa za usporedbnu QA koja se može koristiti u osobnim asistentima, šatlovima i sličnim NLP uređajima. Relativni QA je izazovni zadatak NLP-a, jer zahtijeva skupljanje dokaza podrške iz mnogih različitih izvora, a direktne usporedbe rijetkih objekata možda nisu dostupne čak i na cijeloj mreži. Prvi korak prema rješenju takvog zadatka nudimo testovanje za usporedbenu QA na prirodnom jeziku ispitivajući nekoliko metoda, čineći tri najbolje dostupne kao online demo.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een systeem voor het beantwoorden van vergelijkende vragen (Is X beter dan Y ten opzichte van Z?) in natuurlijke taal. Het beantwoorden van dergelijke vragen is belangrijk om mensen te helpen bij het nemen van weloverwogen beslissingen. Het belangrijkste onderdeel van ons systeem is een natuurlijke taalinterface voor vergelijkende QA die kan worden gebruikt in persoonlijke assistenten, chatbots en soortgelijke NLP-apparaten. Vergelijkende QA is een uitdagende NLP-taak, omdat het ondersteunend bewijs van veel verschillende bronnen vereist, en directe vergelijkingen van zeldzame objecten mogelijk niet beschikbaar zijn, zelfs niet op het hele web. We zetten de eerste stap naar een oplossing voor een dergelijke taak met een testbed voor vergelijkende QA in natuurlijke taal door verschillende methoden te testen, waardoor de drie beste beschikbaar zijn als een online demo.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer et system til besvarelse af komparative spørgsmål (Er X bedre end Y i forhold til Z?) i naturligt sprog. Besvarelse af sådanne spørgsmål er vigtigt for at hjælpe mennesker med at træffe informerede beslutninger. Den vigtigste komponent i vores system er en naturlig sproggrænseflade til sammenlignende QA, der kan bruges i personlige assistenter, chatbots og lignende NLP-enheder. Sammenlignende QA er en udfordrende NLP-opgave, da det kræver indsamling af støttebeviser fra mange forskellige kilder, og direkte sammenligninger af sjældne objekter er muligvis ikke tilgængelige selv på hele internettet. Vi tager det første skridt mod en løsning til en sådan opgave, der tilbyder en testbed til sammenlignende QA i naturligt sprog ved at undersøge flere metoder, der gør de tre bedste tilgængelige som en online demo.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan sistem untuk menjawab pertanyaan perbandingan (Apakah X lebih baik dari Y terhadap Z?) dalam bahasa alam. Jawaban pertanyaan seperti itu penting untuk membantu manusia dalam membuat keputusan yang diberitahu. Komponen kunci dari sistem kita adalah antarmuka bahasa alami untuk QA yang dapat digunakan dalam asisten pribadi, chatbot, dan perangkat NLP yang sama. QA komparatif adalah tugas NLP yang menantang, karena membutuhkan mengumpulkan bukti dukungan dari banyak sumber yang berbeda, dan perbandingan langsung dari objek langka mungkin tidak tersedia bahkan di seluruh Web. Kita mengambil langkah pertama ke arah solusi untuk tugas seperti itu menawarkan tempat ujian untuk QA comparatif dalam bahasa alami dengan menyelidiki beberapa metode, membuat tiga metode terbaik tersedia sebagai demo online.', 'ko': '우리는 비교 문제에 대답하는 시스템을 제시했다. (Z, X는 Y보다 좋습니까?)자연어를 쓰다.이런 질문에 대답하는 것은 인간의 현명한 결정을 돕는 데 매우 중요하다.우리 시스템의 핵심 구성 요소는 QA를 비교하는 데 사용되는 자연 언어 인터페이스로 개인 보조원, 채팅 로봇과 유사한 NLP 장치에 사용할 수 있다.QA를 비교하는 것은 여러 가지 다른 출처에서 지원 증거를 수집해야 하고 전체 네트워크에서도 희귀 대상을 직접 비교할 수 없기 때문에 도전적인 NLP 작업이다.우리는 몇 가지 방법을 모색함으로써 이러한 임무의 해결 방안에 첫걸음을 내디뎠고 자연 언어의 비교QA에 테스트 플랫폼을 제공했으며 세 가지 가장 좋은 방법을 온라인 프레젠테이션으로 제공했다.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren ein System zur Beantwortung von Vergleichsfragen (Ist X besser als Y in Bezug auf Z?) in natürlicher Sprache. Die Beantwortung solcher Fragen ist wichtig, um Menschen dabei zu unterstützen, fundierte Entscheidungen zu treffen. Die Schlüsselkomponente unseres Systems ist eine natürliche Sprachschnittstelle für vergleichende QA, die in persönlichen Assistenten, Chatbots und ähnlichen NLP-Geräten verwendet werden kann. Die vergleichende Qualitätssicherung ist eine herausfordernde NLP-Aufgabe, da sie die Sammlung von Unterstützungsnachweisen aus vielen verschiedenen Quellen erfordert und direkte Vergleiche seltener Objekte möglicherweise nicht einmal im gesamten Web verfügbar sind. Wir machen den ersten Schritt zu einer Lösung für eine solche Aufgabe, indem wir ein Testfeld für vergleichende QA in natürlicher Sprache anbieten, indem wir mehrere Methoden erproben und die drei besten als Online-Demo zur Verfügung stellen.', 'fa': 'ما یک سیستم برای جواب سوالات مقایسه (آیا X بهتر از Y در مورد Z است؟) در زبان طبیعی. پاسخ دادن چنین سوالات برای کمک کردن مردم در تصمیم\u200cهای اطلاعات مهم است. رقم کلید سیستم ما یک ارتباط زبان طبیعی برای QA مقایسه است که می تواند در دستیاران شخصی، چاتبت و دستگاه NLP شبیه استفاده شود. QA مقایسه یک کار NLP مشکل است، زیرا نیاز به جمع مدرک پشتیبانی از منبع های مختلف است، و مقایسه مستقیم چیزهای نادر حتی در کل وب وجود ندارد. ما اولین قدم به سمت یک راه حل برای این کار را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که یک تست برای مقایسه QA در زبان طبیعی با تحقیق چند روش، سه بهترین را به عنوان نمایش آنلاین در دسترس قرار دهیم.', 'sw': 'Tunaweka mfumo wa kujibu maswali yanayolinganisha (Je X ni bora kuliko Y kwa kuhusiana na Z?) kwa lugha ya asili. Kujibu maswali haya ni muhimu kwa kusaidia binadamu kufanya maamuzi yanayoelezwa. Kifungu muhimu cha mfumo wetu ni sura ya lugha ya asili kwa kulinganisha na QA ambacho inaweza kutumika kwa wasaidizi binafsi, mazungumzo na vifaa vinavyofanana na NLP. Kampuni ya QA ni jukumu la NLP, kwa sababu inahitaji kukusanya ushahidi wa kuunga mkono kutoka vyanzo vingi vingi tofauti, na wanalinganishwa moja kwa moja na vitu nadra vinaweza hata kwenye mtandao mzima. We take the first step towards a solution for such a task offering a testbed for comparative QA in natural language by probing several methods, making the three best ones available as an online demo.', 'tr': 'Biz salyklaşy soraglary jogaplamak üçin bir sistemi görkezip berýäris (X Z-den gowymy barmy?) tebigy dilde. Böyle sorulara cevap vermek insanlara bilgi karar vermek için yardım etmek önemlidir. Biziň sistemimiziň a ç komponenti kişisel kömekleyicilerde, çäbotlerde we ýaly NLP cihazlarynda ullanylýan tebigy dil arayüzidir. Referans QA - NLP täsirli zady, sebäbi ol bir näçe çeşitli çeşmelerden desteklän kanunlaryny toplamak gerek, we nadir zadlaryň düzümleşmeleri hem internede bolup biler. Biz bu täzim üçin ilkinji adımy dogry dilde QA karşılaşyk çözümleri çözerek, birnäçe döwletleri barlap, üç iň gowy adamlary internetde demo hökmünde elýeterli edip görýäris.', 'af': "Ons vertoon 'n stelsel vir antwoord van vergelykbare vrae (Is X beter as Y met respek na Z?) in natuurlike taal. Die antwoord van sodanige vrae is belangrik om mense te help in besluit te maak. Die sleutel komponent van ons stelsel is 'n natuurlike taal koppelvlak vir vergelykbare QA wat kan gebruik word in persoonlike assistente, geselskappe en gelyklike NLP toestelle. Vergelykbaar QA is 'n pragtige NLP taak, omdat dit benodig om ondersteunde bevestige te samel van baie verskillende bronne, en direkte vergelykings van rare objekte dalk mag nie beskikbaar wees selfs op die hele Web. Ons neem die eerste stap na 'n oplossing vir so' n taak offer 'n toets vir vergelykbare QA in natuurlike taal deur verskeie metodes te probeer, maak die drie beste een beskikbaar as 'n onlinese demo.", 'am': 'እናሳውቃለን፡፡ in natural language.  እንደዚህ ያሉ ጥያቄዎች መልስ ለሰዎች ማስታወቂያውን በማስረዳት muhimu ነው፡፡ የስርዓታችን መክፈቻ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ ነው፤ የግል መረጃዎች፣ chatbots እና የሚመስሉ የNLP ዕቃዎች ውስጥ የሚጠቀም ይችላል፡፡ አካባቢ QA የNLP አድራጊ ነው፣ ምክንያቱም ከብዙ ዓይነቶች የஆதரவን ማስረጃ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ እንደነዚህ ስራ መጀመሪያ ደረጃን ለመተካከል የQA ቋንቋን ለማስተካከል የመጀመሪያውን ደረጃዎች እናደርጋለን፤ ሦስቱን የበለጠ መረብ አዲስ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'az': 'Biz salıcı sualları cevap vermək üçün sistemi göstəririk (X Z ilə daha yaxşıdır mı?) təbiətli dildə. Bu suallara cavab vermək insanlara bildirilmiş kararlar verməkdə kömək etmək vacibdir. Sistemimizin anahtar komponenti, kişisel yardımcılar, çöpçülər və bənzər NLP aygıtlarında istifadə edilən QA üçün təbiətli dil интерфейсidir. QA müəyyən edilən NLP işidir, çünki bu, çoxlu müxtəlif kaynaqlardan dəstəkləri toplamaq lazımdır, və nadir objeklərin müəyyən edilməsi də bütün İnternettə faydalanmayar. Biz bu işin çətinliklərinə ilk adımı təhsil edirik ki, QA ilə təhsil dilində müəyyən edilmiş QA təhsil edilir, bir neçə metodları imtahana edərək, onlayn demo olaraq üç ən yaxşıları faydalanır.', 'bn': 'আমরা তুলনামূলক প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেবার জন্য একটি সিস্টেম উপস্থাপন করছি (জিজের ব্যাপারে এক্স ভালো? প্রাকৃতিক ভাষায়। এই ধরনের প্রশ্নের উত্তর হলো জ্ঞানিত সিদ্ধান্ত নিয়ে মানুষকে সাহায্য করার জন্য। আমাদের সিস্টেমের প্রধান অংশ হচ্ছে তুলনা করার জন্য প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা ইন্টারফেস যা ব্যক্তিগত সহকারী, চ্যাটবোট এবং একই ধরনের এনএলপি  তুলনামূলক কিউএ একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ এনএলপি কাজ, কারণ এটি অনেক বিভিন্ন উৎস থেকে সমর্থন প্রমাণ সংগ্রহ করার প্রয়োজন এবং পুরো ওয়েবে দুর্লভ বস্তুর সরাসরি ত প্রাকৃতিক ভাষায় কিউ এ-কে তুলনা করার জন্য একটি কাজের সমাধানের প্রথম পদক্ষেপের দিকে আমরা নিয়ে যাচ্ছি বেশ কয়েকটি পদ্ধতি প্রমাণ করে, যারা', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo sistem za odgovor na usporedbene pitanja (Je li X bolji od Y u odnosu na Z?) na prirodnom jeziku. Odgovor na takva pitanja je važno za pomoć ljudima u donošenju informiranih odluka. Ključna komponenta našeg sustava je prirodna jezička interfejsa za usporedbnu QA koja se može koristiti u ličnim asistentima, šatlovima i sličnim NLP uređajima. Prepoređeni QA je izazovni zadatak NLP-a, jer zahtijeva skupljanje dokaza podrške iz mnogih različitih izvora, a direktne usporedbe rijetkih objekata možda nisu dostupne čak i na cijeloj mreži. Prvi korak prema rješenju takvog zadatka nudimo testovanje za usporedbenu QA na prirodnom jeziku probajući nekoliko metoda, čineći tri najbolje dostupne kao online demo.', 'cs': 'Představujeme systém pro zodpovězení srovnávacích otázek (Je X lepší než Y vzhledem k Z?) v přirozeném jazyce. Odpověď na tyto otázky je důležitá pro pomoc lidem při přijímání informovaných rozhodnutí. Klíčovou součástí našeho systému je rozhraní přirozeného jazyka pro srovnávací QA, které lze použít v osobních asistentech, chatbotech a podobných NLP zařízeních. Srovnávací QA je náročný úkol NLP, protože vyžaduje shromažďování podpůrných důkazů z mnoha různých zdrojů a přímé srovnání vzácných objektů nemusí být dostupné ani na celém webu. První krok k řešení takového úkolu uděláme, když nabízíme testovací místo pro srovnávací QA v přírodním jazyce zkoumáním několika metod, které zpřístupní tři nejlepší metody jako online demo.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një sistem për të përgjigjur pyetjeve krahasuese (A është X më i mirë se Y lidhur me Z?) in natural language.  Answering such questions is important for assisting humans in making informed decisions.  Komponenti kyç i sistemit tonë është një interfaqe natyrore gjuhësh për QA krahasuese që mund të përdoret në asistentë personal ë, chatbot dhe paisje të ngjashme NLP. QA krahasuese është një detyrë sfiduese e NLP, pasi kërkon mbledhjen e provave të mbështetjes nga shumë burime të ndryshme dhe krahasimet e drejtpërdrejta të objekteve të rralla mund të mos jenë në dispozicion edhe në të gjithë internetin. Ne marrim hapin e parë drejt një zgjidhjeje për një detyrë të tillë duke ofruar një shtrat të testuar për QA krahasuese në gjuhën natyrore duke hetuar disa metoda, duke i bërë të tre më të mira të disponueshme si një demo online.', 'et': 'Esitame võrdlevatele küsimustele vastamise süsteemi (Kas X on Z suhtes parem kui Y?) looduslikus keeles. Sellistele küsimustele vastamine on oluline, et aidata inimestel teha teadlikke otsuseid. Meie süsteemi võtmekomponent on looduslik keeleliides võrdleva kvaliteedi tagamiseks, mida saab kasutada isiklikes assistentides, chatbotides ja sarnastes NLP seadmetes. Võrdlev kvaliteedi tagamine on keeruline uue tööprogrammi ülesanne, kuna see nõuab tugitõendite kogumist paljudest erinevatest allikatest ning haruldaste objektide otsene võrdlus ei pruugi olla kättesaadav isegi kogu veebis. Me astume esimese sammu sellise ülesande lahenduse leidmise suunas, pakkudes looduskeeles võrdleva kvaliteedi tagamise testimisplatvormi, proovides mitut meetodit, tehes kolm parimat kättesaadavaks online demona.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք համեմատական հարցերին պատասխանելու համակարգ (Արդյո՞ք X-ը ավելի լավ է, քան Y-ը՝ ի հարաբերության մեջ)։ բնական լեզվով: Այսպիսի հարցերի պատասխանը կարևոր է մարդկանց օգնելու տեղեկացված որոշումներ կայացնելու համար: The key component of our system is a natural language interface for comparative QA that can be used in personal assistants, chatbots, and similar NLP devices.  Comparative QA is a challenging NLP task, since it requires collecting support evidence from many different sources, and direct comparisons of rare objects may be not available even on the entire Web.  Մենք առաջին քայլն ենք անում այս խնդրի լուծումների ուղղությամբ, որն առաջարկում է բնական լեզվով համեմատական QA-ի փորձարկումներ, ուսումնասիրելով մի քանի մեթոդներ, դարձնելով երեք լավագույն մեթոդները հասանելի որպես առցանց', 'fi': 'Esittelemme vertaileviin kysymyksiin vastaamisen järjestelmän (Onko X parempi kuin Y suhteessa Z?) luonnollisella kielellä. Tällaisiin kysymyksiin vastaaminen on tärkeää ihmisten auttamiseksi tietoon perustuvien päätösten tekemisessä. Järjestelmämme keskeinen osa on laadunvarmistuksen luontainen käyttöliittymä, jota voidaan käyttää henkilökohtaisissa avustajissa, chatboteissa ja vastaavissa NLP-laitteissa. Vertaileva laadunvarmistus on haastava NLP-tehtävä, koska se vaatii tukiaineiston keräämistä monista eri lähteistä, ja suoria vertailuja harvinaisista kohteista ei välttämättä ole saatavilla edes koko verkossa. Otamme ensimmäisen askeleen kohti ratkaisua tällaiseen tehtävään tarjoamalla testialustan vertailevalle laadunvarmistukselle luonnollisella kielellä tutkimalla useita menetelmiä ja tuomalla kolme parasta saatavilla online-demona.', 'ca': "Presentam un sistema de resposta a preguntes comparatives (És X millor que Y en relació a Z?) en llenguatge natural. Respondre a aquestes preguntes és important per ajudar els humans a prendre decisions informades. El component clau del nostre sistema és una interfície de llenguatge natural per a QA comparativa que es pot utilitzar en assistents personals, chatbots i dispositius similars de NLP. La QA comparativa és una tasca desafiadora del NLP, ja que requereix recollir proves de suport de moltes fonts diferents, i es pot que no siguin disponibles comparacions directes d'objectes rars fins i tot a la Web. Prenem el primer pas cap a una solució d'una tasca així oferint un banc de prova per a una QA comparativa en llenguatge natural investigant diversos mètodes, fent disponibles les tres millors com una demostració en línia.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo sistem za odgovarjanje na primerjalna vprašanja (ali je X boljši od Y glede na Z?) v naravnem jeziku. Odgovor na takšna vprašanja je pomemben za pomoč ljudem pri sprejemanju informiranih odločitev. Ključna komponenta našega sistema je naravni jezikovni vmesnik za primerjalno zagotavljanje kakovosti, ki se lahko uporablja v osebnih asistentih, chatbotih in podobnih napravah NLP. Primerjalno zagotavljanje kakovosti je zahtevna naloga NLP, saj zahteva zbiranje podpornih dokazov iz različnih virov, neposredne primerjave redkih predmetov pa morda niso na voljo niti na celotnem spletu. Prvi korak napredujemo k rešitvi za takšno nalogo, ki ponuja testiranje primerjalnega zagotavljanja kakovosti v naravnem jeziku s proučevanjem več metod, tri najboljše pa so na voljo kot spletni demo.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem kanggo nggantong weruh-weruh gak (X luwih luwih luwih apik Y karo Z?) ning langgar pribadi. Nggambar apa-apa sing dikarepaké waja kanggo ngejaraké wong-wong liya sing beraksi Komponing anyar sistem sing nduwé nglanggar oleh dumadhi kanggo komparasi Where reference Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan nganggo sampeyan kanggo ngilangno nggawe gerakan kelas nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas nang kelas telu maning, iso nggawe sistem sing seperakan online.', 'ha': "Munã halatar da wani system da za'a karɓa wa maswali masu daidaita (Shin X ne mafi alhẽri daga Y da Z?) a cikin harshen natsuwa. Ina muhimu a karɓa wa su ga mataimaki ga mutane a sami-hukuncin da ake bã su lãbãri. Maɓallin sunan na'uranmu yana da wata interfekt na harshen zaman shawara dõmin ka sami QA da za'a yi amfani da su cikin mataimaki masu bassi, chatbots da kwamfyutan kayan NLP. Comparative QA is an tsõratar aikin NLP, sabõda it yana son ta samun shaidar taimako daga manyan sources mãsu yawa, kuma yana kasa ba za'a iya sãmun kwamfyutan abubuwa ko da kuma a cikakken Web. Tuna karɓi ta farko zuwa kafin wannan aikin da ke bãyar da jarraba wa kafarin a sami ga QA cikin harshen as ĩri, kuma Muke jarraba wasu hanyoyi masu yawa, kuma Mu sami sauran uku masu da amfani da su kamar wata dama na Online.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་མ་ལག་ལ་མཐུན་པའི་དྲི་ཚིག་དང་མཐུན་པ་ལུགས་པའི་རིམ་པ་ཞིག་འཆར་འདོད(X་ཡིན་པས་Z་དང་མཐུན་སྐྱེ སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཤིག་ཡིན། འོན་ཀྱང་། འདི་དག་གི་གནད་དོན་ལན་པར་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཆེན་པོ་རེད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག Comparative QA is a challenging NLP task, since it requires collecting support evidence from many different sources, and direct comparisons of rare objects may not be available even on the whole Web. ང་ཚོས་དང་པོ་རེ་ཤོག་ལེབ་ཐབས་ཤེས་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གནང་བ་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים מערכת לענות על שאלות משוואות (האם X טוב יותר מ Y בנוגע לז?) בשפה טבעית. לענות על שאלות כאלה חשובה לסייע בני אדם בהחלטות מודיעות. The key component of our system is a natural language interface for comparative QA that can be used in personal assistants, chatbots, and similar NLP devices.  QA משוואה היא משימה מאתגרת NLP, מכיוון שהיא דורשת לאסוף ראיות תמיכה ממקורים שונים רבים, והשיוואות ישירות של חפצים נדירים אולי לא זמינות אפילו ברשת כולה. אנחנו לוקחים את הצעד הראשון לכיוון פתרון למשימה כזו, מציעים מיטה מבחן עבור QA משוואה בשפה טבעית על ידי חקירה של כמה שיטות, הופכים את שלושת הטובות ביותר זמינות כדמו באינטרנט.'}
{'en': 'Computationally Efficient Wasserstein Loss for Structured Labels', 'ar': 'خسارة Wasserstein ذات الكفاءة الحسابية للملصقات المنظمة', 'fr': 'Perte Wasserstein efficace sur le plan informatique pour les étiquettes structurées', 'pt': 'Perda Wasserstein computacionalmente eficiente para rótulos estruturados', 'es': 'Pérdida de Wasserstein computacionalmente eficiente para etiquetas estructuradas', 'ja': '構造化ラベルの計算効率的ワッサースタイン損失', 'zh': '结构化标者算效率高之 Wasserstein Loss', 'hi': 'संरचित लेबल के लिए कम्प्यूटेशनल रूप से कुशल Wasserstein हानि', 'ru': 'Вычислительно эффективные потери Вассерштейна для структурированных этикеток', 'ga': 'Caillteanas Wasserstein atá Éifeachtúil ó thaobh Ríomhaireachta do Lipéid Struchtúrtha', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Számítástechnikailag hatékony Wasserstein veszteség strukturált címkék esetén', 'el': 'Υπολογιστικά αποδοτική απώλεια για δομημένες ετικέτες', 'it': 'Perdita Wasserstein efficiente dal punto di vista computazionale per etichette strutturate', 'kk': 'Құрылған жарлықтар үшін компьютерлік әсер ететін Wasserstein жоғалуы', 'lt': 'Skaitmeniniu požiūriu efektyvus atliekų steino praradimas struktūriniams ženklams', 'ms': 'Kehilangan Wasserstein Efisien Secara Komputer untuk Label Terstruktur', 'mk': 'Компутационално ефикасна загуба на отпад за структурни етикети', 'mt': 'Telf ta’ Skart Effiċjenti Komputazzjonalment għal Tikketti Strutturati', 'mn': 'Компьютерийн үр дүнтэй Wasserstein Structured Labels-ын алдагдал', 'ml': 'നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട ലേബലുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വാസ്സര്\u200dസ്റ്റീന്\u200d കണക്കില്\u200d പ്രയോജനപ്പെടുന്നു', 'no': 'Computationally Efficient Wasserstein Loss for Structured Labels', 'pl': 'Wydajne obliczeniowo straty Wassersteina dla etykiet strukturalnych', 'ro': 'Pierdere eficientă din punct de vedere calculator Wasserstein pentru etichetele structurate', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Xisaabtan Effective Wasserstein Lost for Structured Labels', 'ta': 'கட்டும் விளக்கச்சீட்டு', 'sv': 'Beräkningseffektiv Wasserstein förlust för strukturerade etiketter', 'ur': 'کمپیوٹر کے طور پر فعال والسرسٹین ساختہ لابلوں کے لئے نقصان', 'sr': 'Kompjuterski efikasni Wasserstein gubitak za strukturirane etikete', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hệ thống máy tính hiệu quả Wasserstein thua cho nhãn được cấu trúc.', 'hr': 'Računalno učinkovito gubitke Wasserstein za strukturne etikete', 'bg': 'Изчислително ефективна загуба на Wasserstein за структурирани етикети', 'nl': 'Computationeel efficiënt waterstein verlies voor gestructureerde etiketten', 'da': 'Beregningseffektivt Wasserstein tab for strukturerede etiketter', 'id': 'Kehilangan Wasserstein Efisien Secara Komputer untuk Label Struktur', 'ko': '구조화된 태그의 계산이 유효한 Wasserstein 손실', 'de': 'Rechnerisch effizienter Wasserstein-Verlust für strukturierte Etiketten', 'sw': 'Wasserstein alipoteza kwa hisia kwa mabango yaliyojengwa', 'tr': 'Computationally Efficient Wasserstein Loss for Structured Labels', 'af': 'Computationally Efficient Wasserstein Loss for Structured Labels', 'fa': 'از دست دادن واسس\u200cرستستان برای نشانه\u200cهای ساخته\u200cشده به صورت کامپیوتری', 'am': 'Computationally Efficient Wasserstein Loss for Structured Labels', 'sq': 'Computationally Efficient Wasserstein Loss for Structured Labels', 'hy': 'Համակարգչային արդյունավետ թափոնների կորստը կառուցվածքային պիտակների համար', 'az': 'Yapılmış etiketlər üçün zərər verən Wasserstein', 'bn': 'Computationally Efficient Wasserstein Loss for Structured Labels', 'bs': 'Kompjuterski efikasni Wasserstein gubitak za strukturirane etikete', 'ca': 'Perda de Wasserstein eficient en termes de computació per a etiquetes estructurats', 'cs': 'Výpočetně efektivní Wasserstein ztráta pro strukturované etikety', 'et': 'Arvutuslikult tõhus Wassersteini kadu struktureeritud märgistuste puhul', 'fi': 'Laskennallisesti tehokas Wassersteinin häviö rakenteellisissa merkinnöissä', 'jv': 'Imagen', 'he': 'איבוד Wasserstein יעיל מחשב לתווים מבושלים', 'sk': 'Računalniško učinkovita izguba Wassersteina za strukturirane etikete', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Computationally Efficient Wasserstein Loss for Structured Labels'}
{'en': 'The problem of estimating the probability distribution of labels has been widely studied as a label distribution learning (LDL) problem, whose applications include age estimation, emotion analysis, and semantic segmentation. We propose a tree-Wasserstein distance regularized LDL algorithm, focusing on hierarchical text classification tasks. We propose predicting the entire label hierarchy using neural networks, where the similarity between predicted and true labels is measured using the tree-Wasserstein distance. Through experiments using synthetic and real-world datasets, we demonstrate that the proposed method successfully considers the structure of labels during training, and it compares favorably with the Sinkhorn algorithm in terms of computation time and memory usage.', 'ar': 'تمت دراسة مشكلة تقدير التوزيع الاحتمالي للملصقات على نطاق واسع كمشكلة تعلم توزيع الملصقات (LDL) ، والتي تشمل تطبيقاتها تقدير العمر ، وتحليل العاطفة ، والتجزئة الدلالية. نقترح خوارزمية LDL منتظمة المسافة بين الأشجار في Wasserstein ، مع التركيز على مهام تصنيف النص الهرمي. نقترح التنبؤ بالتسلسل الهرمي للتسمية بالكامل باستخدام الشبكات العصبية ، حيث يتم قياس التشابه بين التسميات المتوقعة والحقيقية باستخدام مسافة الشجرة-فاسرشتاين. من خلال التجارب التي تستخدم مجموعات البيانات الاصطناعية والواقعية ، نوضح أن الطريقة المقترحة تأخذ في الاعتبار بنية الملصقات بنجاح أثناء التدريب ، وتقارن بشكل إيجابي مع خوارزمية Sinkhorn من حيث وقت الحساب واستخدام الذاكرة.', 'pt': 'O problema de estimar a distribuição de probabilidade de rótulos tem sido amplamente estudado como um problema de aprendizado de distribuição de rótulos (LDL), cujas aplicações incluem estimativa de idade, análise de emoções e segmentação semântica. Propomos um algoritmo de LDL regularizado por distância árvore-Wasserstein, com foco em tarefas de classificação hierárquica de texto. Propomos prever toda a hierarquia de rótulos usando redes neurais, onde a similaridade entre rótulos previstos e verdadeiros é medida usando a distância árvore-Wasserstein. Por meio de experimentos usando conjuntos de dados sintéticos e do mundo real, demonstramos que o método proposto considera com sucesso a estrutura de rótulos durante o treinamento e se compara favoravelmente com o algoritmo Sinkhorn em termos de tempo de computação e uso de memória.', 'fr': "Le problème de l'estimation de la distribution de probabilité des étiquettes a été largement étudié en tant que problème d'apprentissage de la distribution des étiquettes (LDL), dont les applications incluent l'estimation de l'âge, l'analyse des émotions et la segmentation sémantique. Nous proposons un algorithme LDL régularisé à distance Tree-Wasserstein, axé sur les tâches de classification hiérarchique des textes. Nous proposons de prédire l'ensemble de la hiérarchie des étiquettes à l'aide de réseaux de neurones, où la similitude entre les étiquettes prédites et vraies est mesurée à l'aide de la distance Tree-Wasserstein. Grâce à des expériences utilisant des ensembles de données synthétiques et réels, nous démontrons que la méthode proposée tient compte avec succès de la structure des étiquettes pendant l'entraînement et qu'elle se compare favorablement à l'algorithme Sinkhorn en termes de temps de calcul et d'utilisation de la mémoire.", 'es': 'El problema de estimar la distribución de probabilidad de las etiquetas se ha estudiado ampliamente como un problema de aprendizaje de distribución de etiquetas (LDL), cuyas aplicaciones incluyen la estimación de la edad, el análisis de emociones y la segmentación semántica. Proponemos un algoritmo LDL regularizado a distancia Tree-Wasserstein, centrado en tareas de clasificación jerárquica de textos. Proponemos predecir toda la jerarquía de etiquetas mediante redes neuronales, donde la similitud entre las etiquetas predichas y verdaderas se mide utilizando la distancia Tree-Wasserstein. A través de experimentos con conjuntos de datos sintéticos y del mundo real, demostramos que el método propuesto considera con éxito la estructura de las etiquetas durante el entrenamiento y se compara favorablemente con el algoritmo de Sinkhorn en términos de tiempo de cálculo y uso de memoria.', 'ja': 'ラベルの確率分布を推定する問題は、年齢推定、感情分析、セマンティックセグメンテーションなどの応用を含むラベル分布学習（ LDL ）問題として広く研究されている。階層的なテキスト分類タスクに焦点を当て、ツリー-ワッサーシュタイン距離正規化LDLアルゴリズムを提案します。ニューラルネットワークを使用してラベル階層全体を予測することを提案し、ここでは、予測されたラベルと真のラベルの類似性は、ツリー-ワッサーシュタイン距離を使用して測定されます。合成データセットと現実世界のデータセットを用いた実験を通じて、提案された手法は、トレーニング中にラベルの構造をうまく考慮し、計算時間とメモリ使用量の点でシンクホーンアルゴリズムと比較して有利であることを実証した。', 'zh': '计其概率分布者,博究分布学(LDL),宜及年齿,情析语义分。 建一树-Wasserstein去正则化LDL算法,专注文本分类。 臣等议用神经网络占全标层次结构,其占标签与真签之间相似性用树-Wasserstein相去以测之。 合数实验实,证成于训练,计日月内存用,利Sinkhorn算法。', 'hi': 'लेबल की संभाव्यता वितरण का अनुमान लगाने की समस्या का व्यापक रूप से लेबल वितरण सीखने (एलडीएल) समस्या के रूप में अध्ययन किया गया है, जिसके अनुप्रयोगों में आयु अनुमान, भावना विश्लेषण और शब्दार्थ विभाजन शामिल हैं। हम एक ट्री-वासेरस्टीन दूरी नियमित एलडीएल एल्गोरिथ्म का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो पदानुक्रमित पाठ वर्गीकरण कार्यों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करता है। हम तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग करके पूरे लेबल पदानुक्रम की भविष्यवाणी करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जहां भविष्यवाणी की गई और सच्चे लेबल के बीच समानता को पेड़-वासेरस्टीन दूरी का उपयोग करके मापा जाता है। सिंथेटिक और वास्तविक दुनिया डेटासेट का उपयोग करके प्रयोगों के माध्यम से, हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि प्रस्तावित विधि सफलतापूर्वक प्रशिक्षण के दौरान लेबल की संरचना पर विचार करती है, और यह गणना समय और स्मृति उपयोग के संदर्भ में सिंकहॉर्न एल्गोरिथ्म के साथ अनुकूल रूप से तुलना करती है।', 'ga': 'Rinneadh staidéar forleathan ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le meastachán a dhéanamh ar dháileadh dóchúlachta lipéid mar fhadhb foghlama dáileadh lipéad (LDL), a n-áirítear a n-iarratas meastachán aoise, anailís mothúcháin, agus deighilt shéimeantach. Molaimid algartam LDL a rialaítear le fad crann-Wasserstein, ag díriú ar thascanna ordlathacha aicmithe téacs. Molaimid an t-ordlathas lipéad iomlán a thuar trí úsáid a bhaint as líonraí néaracha, áit a ndéantar an chosúlacht idir lipéid thuartha agus fíor-lipéad a thomhas ag baint úsáide as an fad crann-Wasserstein. Trí thurgnaimh ag baint úsáide as tacair sonraí sintéiseacha agus fíor-domhan, léirímid go ndéanann an modh atá beartaithe struchtúr na lipéid a mheas go rathúil le linn na hoiliúna, agus go ndéanann sé comparáid fhabhrach le algartam Sinkhorn i dtéarmaí ama ríomhaireachta agus úsáid cuimhne.', 'ru': 'Проблема оценки вероятностного распределения меток широко изучалась как проблема обучения распределению меток (LDL), приложения которой включают оценку возраста, анализ эмоций и семантическую сегментацию. Мы предлагаем алгоритм Древо-Вассерштейновского ДИСТАНЦИОННО-РЕГУЛЯРИЗИРОВАННОГО ЛПНП, ориентированный на задачи иерархической классификации текста. Предложено прогнозировать всю иерархию меток с помощью нейронных сетей, где сходство между предсказанными и истинными метками измеряется с помощью дерева-расстояния Вассерштейна. Экспериментируя с использованием синтетических и реальных наборов данных, мы демонстрируем, что предлагаемый метод успешно учитывает структуру меток во время обучения, и он выгодно сравнивается с алгоритмом Синкхорна с точки зрения времени вычислений и использования памяти.', 'ka': 'პრობლემა, რომელსაც პრობლემა იქნება ასაკის განსაზღვრება, ემოციონის ანალიზაცია და სენმანტიური სეგმენტიკის განსაზღვრება. ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ ახალგაზრდის სტრიქციაციის განმავლობაში LDL ალგორიტიმს, რომელიც იერაქტიკალური ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციის მომუშაობაზე დავყენებთ. ჩვენ გვეძლევა წარმოდგინოთ ყველა ლებლის იერაქტია, რომელიც ნეიროლური ქსელების გამოყენება, სადაც წარმოდგინული და მართლა ლებლის შორის სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა, რო ექსპერიმენტების გამოყენებით სინტეტიკური და რეალური მსოფლიოს მონაცემების შემთხვევაში, ჩვენ გამოწვება, რომ მინდა წარმოიდგინეთ პროგრამის სტრუქტურაციას, რომელიც განაკეთებული სინქორნის ალგორიტი', 'hu': 'A címkék valószínűségi eloszlásának becslésének problémáját széles körben tanulmányozták, mint egy címkeloszlási tanulás (LDL) probléma, amelynek alkalmazásai közé tartozik az életkor becslése, az érzelmek elemzése és a szemantikai szegmentáció. Egy fa-Wasserstein távolság szabályozású LDL algoritmust javasolunk, amely a hierarchikus szövegosztályozási feladatokra összpontosít. Javasoljuk, hogy a teljes címke hierarchiát neurális hálózatok segítségével előrejelezzük, ahol a becsült és valódi címkék hasonlóságát a fa-Wasserstein távolság segítségével mérjük. Szintetikus és valós adatkészleteket használó kísérletek révén bizonyítjuk, hogy a javasolt módszer sikeresen figyelembe veszi a címkék szerkezetét edzés során, és kedvezően hasonlít a Sinkhorn algoritmushoz a számítási idő és a memória használata tekintetében.', 'el': 'Το πρόβλημα της εκτίμησης της κατανομής πιθανότητας των ετικετών έχει μελετηθεί ευρέως ως ένα πρόβλημα μάθησης κατανομής ετικετών (του οποίου οι εφαρμογές περιλαμβάνουν εκτίμηση ηλικίας, ανάλυση συναισθημάτων και σημασιολογική κατάτμηση. Προτείνουμε έναν κανονικό αλγόριθμο απόστασης δέντρου-νερού, εστιάζοντας σε ιεραρχικές εργασίες ταξινόμησης κειμένου. Προτείνουμε την πρόβλεψη ολόκληρης της ιεραρχίας ετικετών χρησιμοποιώντας νευρωνικά δίκτυα, όπου η ομοιότητα μεταξύ προβλεπόμενων και πραγματικών ετικετών μετράται χρησιμοποιώντας την απόσταση δέντρου-νερού. Μέσα από πειράματα με συνθετικά και πραγματικά σύνολα δεδομένων, καταδεικνύουμε ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος λαμβάνει επιτυχώς υπόψη τη δομή των ετικετών κατά τη διάρκεια της εκπαίδευσης και συγκρίνεται ευνοϊκά με τον αλγόριθμο όσον αφορά τον χρόνο υπολογισμού και τη χρήση μνήμης.', 'it': "Il problema della stima della distribuzione di probabilità delle etichette è stato ampiamente studiato come problema di apprendimento della distribuzione di etichette (LDL), le cui applicazioni includono la stima dell'età, l'analisi delle emozioni e la segmentazione semantica. Proponiamo un algoritmo LDL regolarizzato a distanza albero-Wasserstein, concentrandosi sulle attività di classificazione gerarchica del testo. Proponiamo di prevedere l'intera gerarchia delle etichette utilizzando reti neurali, dove la somiglianza tra etichette predittive e vere viene misurata utilizzando la distanza albero-Wasserstein. Attraverso esperimenti utilizzando set di dati sintetici e reali, dimostriamo che il metodo proposto considera con successo la struttura delle etichette durante l'allenamento, e si confronta favorevolmente con l'algoritmo Sinkhorn in termini di tempo di calcolo e utilizzo della memoria.", 'lt': 'Labelių pasiskirstymo tikimybės vertinimo problem a buvo plačiai išnagrinėta kaip ženklų pasiskirstymo mokymosi (MTL) problema, kurios taikymo sritys apima amžiaus vertinimą, emocijų analizę ir semantinę segmentaciją. Siūlome medžio ir Wassersteino atstumu reguliuojamą MTL algoritmą, daugiausia dėmesio skiriant hierarchiniams tekstų klasifikavimo uždaviniams. Siūlome numatyti visą etiketės hierarchiją naudojant nervinius tinklus, kur numatomų ir tikrų etiketių panašumas matuojamas naudojant medžio ir Wassersteino atstumą. Per eksperimentus, kuriuose naudojami sintetiniai ir realieji duomenų rinkiniai, įrodome, kad siūlomas metodas sėkmingai svarsto etikečių struktūrą mokymo metu, ir jis palankiai palyginamas su Sinkhorn algoritmu skaičiavimo laiko ir atminties naudojimo atžvilgiu.', 'ms': 'Masalah menghargai pembagian kebarangkalian label telah dipelajari secara luas sebagai masalah pembelajaran label (LDL), aplikasinya termasuk penilaian usia, analisis emosi, dan segmentasi semantik. Kami cadangkan algoritma LDL yang ditetapkan jarak pokok-Wasserstein, fokus pada tugas kelasukan teks hierarkis. Kami cadangkan meramalkan seluruh hierarki label menggunakan rangkaian saraf, di mana persamaan antara label yang dijangka dan benar diukur menggunakan jarak pokok-Wasserstein. Melalui eksperimen menggunakan set data sintetik dan dunia nyata, kami menunjukkan bahawa kaedah yang diusulkan berjaya mempertimbangkan struktur label semasa latihan, dan ia membandingkan dengan baik dengan algoritma Sinkhorn dalam terma pengiraan masa dan penggunaan ingatan.', 'mk': 'Проблемот на проценката на веројатноста на дистрибуцијата на етикетите е широко проучен како проблем со учењето на дистрибуцијата на етикетите (ЛДЛ), чии апликации вклучуваат проценка на возраст, емоционална анализа и семантична сегментација. Предложуваме алгоритм LDL регулизиран од дрво и Васерстин, фокусиран на хиерархичните задачи за класификација на текст. Предложуваме предвидување на целата хиерархија на етикетата користејќи невровни мрежи, каде сличноста помеѓу предвидени и вистински етикети се мери користејќи ја дистанцата дрво-Вассерстин. Со експерименти користејќи синтетички и реални датотеки, ние демонстрираме дека предложениот метод успешно ја разгледува структурата на етикетите за време на обуката, и тоа се споредува со алгоритмот Синкхорн во поглед на времето на компјутација и употребата на меморијата.', 'ml': 'ലേബലുകളുടെ വിതരണ വിതരണ വിതരണ പഠിപ്പിക്കാനുള്ള സാധ്യതയുടെ വിശദീകരണത്തിന്റെ പ്രശ്നം വിശാലമായി പഠിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d പ We propose a tree-Wasserstein distance regularized LDL algorithm, focusing on hierarchical text classification tasks.  ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ലേബിലെ മുഴുവന്\u200d ഹീയറാര്\u200dജ്ജി പ്രവചിപ്പിക്കുന്നതാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കു പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് സിന്\u200dറെറ്റിക്കും യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോക ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളിലൂടെയും, പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച രീതിയില്\u200d വിജയിച്ച് പരീക്ഷിക്ക', 'mn': 'Магадгүй тэмдэгтийн хуваарилалтын асуудал нь загварын хуваарилалтын суралцах (LDL) асуудлын хуваарилалтын асуудлыг шинжлэх ухаан болгосон. Хэрэглэгчид нас хүрэх, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээ, м Бид мод-Wasserstein зай зөвхөн LDL алгоритмыг зөвхөн төвлөрүүлж, hierarchical text classification tasks дээр төвлөрүүлж байна. Бид нар мэдрэлийн сүлжээг ашиглаж байгаа бүх загварыг таамаглаж байна. Хэрвээ тодорхойлолтой болон үнэн загварын хоорондох тэнцүү байдал нь мод-Васерстейн зайг ашиглаж хэмжигддэг. Синтетик, жинхэнэ дэлхийн өгөгдлийн сангуудыг ашиглан туршилтаар бид санал өгсөн арга нь сургалтын үед загварын бүтцийг амжилттай ойлгохыг харуулж байна. Энэ нь Синкорн алгоритмыг тооцоолох цаг, санамж хэрэглэх үед сайн харьцуулдаг.', 'no': 'Problemet med å vurdere sannsynlighetsferdelingen av merkelappar er veldig studiert som problem med utdeling av merkelappar (LDL), der programmet inneheld aldersestimering, emosjonsanalyse og semantisk segmentasjon. Vi foreslår ein treWasserstein avstanden som regulert LDL-algoritme, som fokuserer på hierarkiske tekstklassifikasjonsprogrammer. Vi foreslår å forhåndsvisa heile merkelappehierarkien med nøyralnettverk, der likninga mellom foregåande og sanne merkelapper er målt med distansen av tre-Wasserstein. Gjennom eksperimenter med syntetiske og verdsdatasett, viser vi at den foreslåde metoden suksessfull ser på strukturen av merkelappar under opplæring, og det sammenlignar favoritt med Sinkhorn-algoritmen ved hjelp av rekningstid og minnebruk.', 'ro': 'Problema estimării distribuției probabilității etichetelor a fost studiată pe scară largă ca o problemă de învățare a distribuției etichetelor (LDL), ale cărei aplicații includ estimarea vârstei, analiza emoțiilor și segmentarea semantică. Propunem un algoritm LDL regularizat de distanță arbore-Wasserstein, concentrându-se pe sarcini ierarhice de clasificare a textului. Propunem predicția întregii ierarhii a etichetelor folosind rețele neurale, unde similaritatea dintre etichetele prevăzute și adevărate este măsurată folosind distanța arbore-Wasserstein. Prin experimente folosind seturi de date sintetice și reale, demonstrăm că metoda propusă ia în considerare cu succes structura etichetelor în timpul antrenamentului și se compară favorabil cu algoritmul Sinkhorn în ceea ce privește timpul de calcul și utilizarea memoriei.', 'pl': 'Problem szacowania rozkładu prawdopodobieństwa etykiet został szeroko zbadany jako problem uczenia się dystrybucji etykiet (LDL), którego zastosowania obejmują szacowanie wieku, analizę emocji i segmentację semantyczną. Proponujemy algorytm LDL regulalizowany na odległość drzewa-Wassersteina, koncentrujący się na hierarchicznych zadaniach klasyfikacji tekstu. Proponujemy przewidywanie całej hierarchii etykiet przy użyciu sieci neuronowych, gdzie podobieństwo między przewidywanymi i prawdziwymi etykietami jest mierzone za pomocą odległości drzewa-Wassersteina. Poprzez eksperymenty z wykorzystaniem syntetycznych i rzeczywistych zbiorów danych pokazujemy, że proponowana metoda z powodzeniem uwzględnia strukturę etykiet podczas treningu i korzystnie porównuje się z algorytmem Sinkhorna pod względem czasu obliczeń i wykorzystania pamięci.', 'kk': 'Жарлықтардың маңыздылық үлестірімін бағалау мәселесі жарлық үлестірімін (LDL) үйрену мәселесі ретінде көп оқылды, қолданбаларының жасырын бағалау, емоциялық анализ және semantic сегментаци Біз ағаш- Wasserstein LDL алгоритмінің қашықтығын қадамдастырып, иерархикалық мәтін классификациялау тапсырмаларына назар аударып тұрады. Біз жарлық иерархиясын невралдық желілерді қолдану үшін ұсынып тастаймыз. Алдындағы жарлықтар мен шын жарлықтар арасындағы ұқсас жарлықтарын бұтас- Вассерстейндің қашықтығымен өлше Синтетикалық және шын әлемдегі деректер жиындарын қолданатын тәжірибелер арқылы, ұсынылған тәжірибелердің құрылымын оқыту кезінде сәтті ұсынып, синкорн алгоритміне есептеу уақыты мен жады пайдалануы қалай салыстырып,', 'si': 'ලේබල්ගේ සංභාවිත විතරය අනුමානය කරන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලේබල් විතරය (LDL) ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සම්බන්ධ විශ අපි ගස් වැස්සෙර්ස්ටින් දුරට ප්\u200dරමාණය කරපු LDL ඇල්ගෝරිතම් එකක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරනවා. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්නේ න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලය භාවිතා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි, කොහෙද ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ඇත්ත ලේබල සංවිධානය සහ ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ දත්ත සේට් භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සමහරවිට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරල', 'so': "Dhibaatada ku saabsan qiimeynta suurtagalnimada looga qeybin karo alaabta waxaa loo baray sida dhibaato loo barto barashada alaabta (LDL), kuwaas oo ay codsigoodu ku qoran yihiin qiimeynta da'da, shahaadada hissiga iyo qaybinta semantika. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa qori-Wasserstein oo la xeelay LDL-algoritm, oo ku kalsoonayo shaqooyinka qoraalka fasaxa ee hierarchical text. Waxaynu horumarinaynaa in aan ka hor dhigno shabakado neurada ah oo dhan, kaas oo lagu qiyaasaa halka midibka la sii sheegay iyo alaabta runta ah oo lagu isticmaalayo geedka Wasserstein. Imtixaanka lagu isticmaalayo macluumaadka labaad ee caalamiga ah iyo si dhab ah ayaannu muujinnaa in qaababka la soo jeeday uu liibaano ka fiirsado dhismaha calaamadaha xiliga waxbarashada, waxayna si wanaagsan ugu dhigtaa algoritka Sinkhorn, si loo baroorto waqtiga xisaabinta iyo isticmaalka xusuusta.", 'sv': 'Problemet med att uppskatta sannolikhetsfﾃｶrdelningen av etiketter har studerats i stor utstrﾃ､ckning som ett LDL-problem, vars tillﾃ､mpningar inkluderar ﾃ･ldersuppskattning, emotionsanalys och semantisk segmentering. Vi fﾃｶreslﾃ･r en tree-Wasserstein distansreglerad LDL algoritm, med fokus pﾃ･ hierarkiska textklassificeringsuppgifter. Vi fﾃｶreslﾃ･r att man fﾃｶrutsﾃ､ger hela etiketthierarkin med hjﾃ､lp av neurala nﾃ､tverk, dﾃ､r likheten mellan fﾃｶrutsedda och sanna etiketter mﾃ､ts med hjﾃ､lp av tree-Wasserstein avstﾃ･ndet. Genom experiment med syntetiska och verkliga datauppsﾃ､ttningar visar vi att den fﾃｶreslagna metoden framgﾃ･ngsrikt beaktar strukturen pﾃ･ etiketter under trﾃ､ning, och den jﾃ､mfﾃｶr positivt med Sinkhorn algoritmen vad gﾃ､ller berﾃ､kningstid och minnesanvﾃ､ndning.', 'mt': 'Il-problem a tal-istima tad-distribuzzjoni tal-probabbiltà tat-tikketti ġiet studjata b’mod wiesa’ bħala problema tat-tagħlim tad-distribuzzjoni tat-tikketta (LDL), li l-applikazzjonijiet tagħha jinkludu stima tal-età, analiżi emozzjonali, u segmentazzjoni semantika. Aħna nipproponu algoritmu LDL regolat mid-distanza bejn is-siġar u Wasserstein, li jiffoka fuq kompiti ta’ klassifikazzjoni tat-test ġerarkiċi. Aħna nipproponu li titbassar il-ġerarkija sħiħa tat-tikketta bl-użu ta’ netwerks newrali, fejn titkejjel is-similarità bejn it-tikketta mbassra u dik vera bl-użu tad-distanza bejn is-siġar u l-Wasserstein. Permezz ta’ esperimenti bl-użu ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta sintetiċi u tad-dinja reali, aħna nuru li l-metodu propost jikkunsidra b’suċċess l-istruttura tat-tikketti waqt it-taħriġ, u dan iqabbel b’mod favorevoli mal-algoritmu Sinkhorn f’termini ta’ ħin tal-komputazzjoni u użu tal-memorja.', 'ta': 'சிட்டைகளின் விரிவாக்கத்தை மதிப்பதற்கான பிரச்சினையின் பிரச்சினை நாங்கள் ஒரு மரத்தை வாஸ்சர்ஸ்டீன் தூரத்தை கட்டுப்படுத்தி LDL ஆல்பரித்துரையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். நாங்கள் முழு விளக்கச்சீட்டு மூலம் புதிய வலைப்பின்னல்களை பயன்படுத்தி முழு விளக்கச்சீட்டை முற்படுத்துகிறோம், அதில் முன்வாக்கப்பட சோதனைகளின் மூலம் கூட்டிணைப்பு மற்றும் உண்மையான உலக தரவுத்தளங்களை பயன்படுத்தி நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் முன்னிருப்பப்பட்ட முறைமையாக பயிற்சியின் அட்டவணையின் உர', 'ur': 'لیبلوں کی احتمال تقسیم کا مسئلہ بہت زیادہ پڑھا گیا ہے ایک لیبل تقسیم کی تعلیم (LDL) مسئلہ کے طور پر، جس کی کاربریوں میں عمر کا ارزش، احساسات تحلیل اور سیمنٹی سیگنٹ ہے. ہم ایک درخت واسس سٹر کی پیشنهاد کریں گے جو فاصلہ منطقی LDL الگوریتم میں ہے، جسے ہیراراتیکل ٹیکس کلاسپیٹ کے کاموں پر تمرکز کرتا ہے. ہم نے نئورل نیٹورک کے مطابق تمام لیبل آئارک کی پیش بینی کی پیش بینی کی ہے جہاں پیش بینی کی اور سچ لیبل کے درمیان برابری کا اندازہ گیا ہے درخت واسرسٹین کے فاصلہ سے۔ سینٹیسی اور حقیقی دنیاوی ڈیٹ سٹ کے مطابق آزمائش کے ذریعہ، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی طریقہ سفارش کے طور پر لابل کی ساختار کو تربیت کے وقت دیکھتا ہے، اور یہ سینکورن الگوریتم سے کامپیوتر زمان اور یاد مصرف کے مطابق مطابق مطابق مطاب', 'sr': 'Problem procjene verovatnoće distribucije etiketa je široko proučen kao problem sa učenjem distribucije etiketa (LDL), čije aplikacije uključuju procjenu starosti, analizu emocija i semantičku segmentaciju. Predlažemo udaljenost drveta-Wasserstein a regulariziranog LDL algoritma, fokusirajući se na hijerarhijske klasifikacije teksta. Predlažemo predviđanje cijele hijerarhije etiketa koristeći neuralne mreže, gde se sličnost između predviđenih i pravih etiketa mjera korištenjem udaljenosti drveta-Wassersteina. Kroz eksperimente koristeći sintetičke i realne svjetske podatke, pokazujemo da je predložena metoda uspešno smatrala strukturu etiketa tokom treninga, i to uspoređuje favoritno sa sinkhorskim algoritmom u smislu korištenja vremena računala i memorije.', 'vi': 'Vấn đề ước tính tỷ lệ tỷ lệ của nhãn được nghiên cứu rộng như một vấn đề về nghiên cứu về tỷ lệ phân phối nhãn (khai thác độ tuổi tác, phân tích cảm xúc, và phân chia ngữ pháp. Chúng tôi đề xuất thuật toán LDAP theo quy định đường cây Wasserstein, tập trung vào các nhiệm vụ phân loại văn bản cấp bậc. Chúng tôi đề nghị dự đoán toàn bộ hệ thống nhãn bằng mạng thần kinh, nơi điểm tương đồng giữa các nhãn được dự đoán và chính xác được đo bằng khoảng cách cây Wasserstein. Qua các thí nghiệm sử dụng các bộ dữ liệu nhân tạo và thế giới thực, chúng tôi chứng minh rằng phương pháp đã được đề nghị xem xét thành công cấu trúc của nhãn trong thời gian huấn luyện, và nó được so sánh thuận lợi với thuật toán của thần tượng Sinkhorn về thời gian tính và sử dụng bộ nhớ.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Biz daraxt-Wasserstein orasidagi LDL algoritni boshqarish talab qilamiz, hierarchik matn classifikasining vazifalarini foydalanamiz. We propose predicting the entire label hierarchy using neural networks, where the similarity between predicted and true labels is measured using the tree-Wasserstein distance.  Sinthetik va haqiqiqiy dunyo maʼlumotlar tarkibini ishlatish orqali biz rivojlanadigan usul muvaffaqiyatli o'rganish paytidagi lab tuzillarning tuzilishini o'ylab ko'rsatumiz va u Sinkhorn algoritni hisoblash vaqti va xotir foydalanishiga qisqaradi.", 'bg': 'Проблемът с оценката на вероятностното разпределение на етикетите е широко проучен като проблем за учене на разпределение на етикети (чиито приложения включват оценка на възрастта, анализ на емоциите и семантична сегментация. Предлагаме алгоритъм с регулируема дистанция дърво-Васерщайн, фокусиран върху задачите за йерархична класификация на текста. Предлагаме прогнозиране на цялата йерархия на етикетите чрез невронни мрежи, където сходството между прогнозираните и истинските етикети се измерва с помощта на разстоянието дърво-Васерщайн. Чрез експерименти, използващи синтетични и реални набори от данни, ние демонстрираме, че предложеният метод успешно отчита структурата на етикетите по време на обучението и се сравнява благоприятно с алгоритъма на Синхорн по отношение на времето за изчисляване и използването на паметта.', 'da': 'Problemet med at estimere sandsynlighedsfordelingen af etiketter er blevet bredt undersøgt som et label distribution learning problem (LDL), hvis anvendelser omfatter aldersestimering, følelsesanalyse og semantisk segmentering. Vi foreslår en træ-Wasserstein distance reguleret LDL algoritme, der fokuserer på hierarkiske tekstklassifikationsopgaver. Vi foreslår at forudsige hele etikethierarkiet ved hjælp af neurale netværk, hvor ligheden mellem forudsigede og sande etiketter måles ved hjælp af træ-Wasserstein afstanden. Gennem eksperimenter med syntetiske og virkelige datasæt viser vi, at den foreslåede metode med succes overvejer strukturen af etiketter under træning, og den sammenligner positivt med Sinkhorn algoritmen med hensyn til beregningstid og hukommelsesforbrug.', 'nl': 'Het probleem van het schatten van de waarschijnlijkheidsverdeling van labels is breed bestudeerd als een label distribution learning (LDL) probleem, waarvan de toepassingen leeftijdsschatting, emotie analyse en semantische segmentatie omvatten. We stellen een tree-Wasserstein afstand geregulariseerd LDL algoritme voor, gericht op hiërarchische tekstclassificatietaken. We stellen voor om de volledige labelhiërarchie te voorspellen met behulp van neurale netwerken, waarbij de gelijkenis tussen voorspelde en echte labels wordt gemeten met behulp van de boom-Wasserstein afstand. Door middel van experimenten met synthetische en real-world datasets, laten we zien dat de voorgestelde methode succesvol rekening houdt met de structuur van labels tijdens de training, en het vergelijkt gunstig met het Sinkhorn algoritme in termen van rekentijd en geheugengebruik.', 'de': 'Das Problem der Schätzung der Wahrscheinlichkeitsverteilung von Etiketten wurde als Label Distribution Learning (LDL)-Problem weithin untersucht, dessen Anwendungen Altersschätzung, Emotionsanalyse und semantische Segmentierung umfassen. Wir schlagen einen Baum-Wasserstein distanzregularisierten LDL Algorithmus vor, der sich auf hierarchische Textklassifikationsaufgaben konzentriert. Wir schlagen vor, die gesamte Etikettenhierarchie mittels neuronaler Netze vorherzusagen, wobei die Ähnlichkeit zwischen vorhergesagten und wahren Etiketten anhand der Baum-Wasserstein-Entfernung gemessen wird. Durch Experimente mit synthetischen und realen Datensätzen zeigen wir, dass die vorgeschlagene Methode die Struktur von Labels während des Trainings erfolgreich berücksichtigt und sich hinsichtlich Rechenzeit und Speichernutzung positiv mit dem Sinkhorn-Algorithmus vergleicht.', 'id': 'Masalah memperkirakan distribusi kemungkinan label telah dipelajari secara luas sebagai masalah pembelajaran distribusi label (LDL), aplikasinya termasuk perhitungan usia, analisis emosi, dan segmentasi semantis. Kami mengusulkan sebuah algoritma LDL yang mengatur jarak pohon-Wasserstein, fokus pada tugas klasifikasi teks hierarkis. Kami mengusulkan memprediksi seluruh hierarki label menggunakan jaringan saraf, di mana persamaan antara label yang diprediksi dan benar diukur menggunakan jarak pohon-Wasserstein. Melalui eksperimen menggunakan set data sintetis dan dunia nyata, kami menunjukkan bahwa metode yang diusulkan berhasil mempertimbangkan struktur label selama latihan, dan itu membandingkan dengan baik dengan algoritma Sinkhorn dalam terma waktu komputasi dan penggunaan memori.', 'hr': 'Problem procjene vjerojatnosti distribucije etiketa široko je proučen kao problem s učenjem distribucije etiketa (LDL), čije primjene uključuju procjenu starosti, analizu emocija i semantičku segmentaciju. Predlažemo sistemirani LDL algoritam na udaljenosti drveta-Wasserstein, fokusirajući se na hijerarhičke funkcije klasifikacije teksta. Predlažemo predvidjeti cijelu hijerarhiju etikete koristeći neuralne mreže, gdje se sličnost između predviđenih i pravih etiketa mjera korištenjem udaljenosti drveta-Wasserstein. Kroz eksperimente koristeći sintetičke i realne svjetske podatke, pokazujemo da je predložena metoda uspješno smatrala strukturu etiketa tijekom treninga i uspoređuje favoritno sa sinkhorskim algoritmom u pogledu vremena računala i upotrebe pamćenja.', 'sw': 'Tatizo la kutathmini uwezekano wa usambazaji wa mabango yamekuwa likisoma kwa kiasi kikubwa kama tatizo la elimu ya usambazaji wa alama (LDL), ambalo matumizi yake yanajumuisha takwimu za umri, uchambuzi wa hisia, na vipengele vya sekunde. Tunapendelea mti wa Wasserstein kwa umbali unaoendelea utaratibu wa LDL, tukizingatia kazi za usambazaji wa maandishi ya kivitabu. Tunazipendekeza kutabiri vifaa vyote vya alama kwa kutumia mitandao ya neura, ambapo usawa kati ya alama za kitabiri na alama halisi hupimiwa kwa kutumia umbali wa mti wa Wasserstein. Kwa kupitia majaribio kwa kutumia seti za taarifa za pamoja na halisi za dunia, tunaonyesha kuwa mbinu hizo zinazopendekezwa kwa mafanikio hufikiria muundo wa mabango wakati wa mafunzo, na inalinganisha vizuri na utaratibu wa Sinkhorn kwa ajili ya muda wa hisabati na matumizi ya kumbukumbu.', 'fa': 'مشکل تقسیم احتمالات تقسیم برچسب به وسیله مشکل تقسیم برچسب (LDL) مطالعه شده است که کاربردهای آن شامل ارزیابی سن، تحلیل احساسات و تقسیم semantic است. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک الگوریتم LDL درخت و واسستی را در فاصله\u200cای که روی کارهای مختصات متن الکتریکی تمرکز می\u200cکند. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که کل سطح برچسب را با استفاده از شبکه\u200cهای عصبی پیش\u200cبینی و برچسب\u200cهای حقیقی با فاصله درخت-واسستین اندازه می\u200cگیرد. از طریق آزمایشات با استفاده از مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای سینکورن و دنیای واقعی، نشان می\u200cدهیم که این روش پیشنهاد موفقیت ساختار نقاشی را در طول تمرین به نظر می\u200cرسد، و آن با الگوریتم سینکورن به نظر زمان محاسبات و استفاده حافظه به طور کامل مقایسه می\u200cکند.', 'ko': '라벨 확률 분포 추정 문제는 라벨 분포 학습(LDL) 문제로서 광범위한 연구를 받았는데 그 응용은 나이 추정, 감정 분석과 의미 분할을 포함한다.우리는 트리-바세스탄 거리 정규화 LDL 알고리즘을 제기하여 층별 텍스트 분류 임무에 중점을 두었다.우리는 신경 네트워크를 이용하여 전체 라벨의 차원 구조를 예측할 것을 권장하는데 그 중에서 라벨과 실제 라벨 간의 유사성을 예측하는 데는 나무 와세스탄 거리를 사용하여 측정할 것을 권장한다.합성 데이터 집합과 실제 데이터 집합을 사용하는 실험을 통해 우리는 제시한 방법이 훈련 기간 라벨의 구조를 성공적으로 고려했고 계산 시간과 메모리 사용에 있어 Sinkhorn 알고리즘에 비해 우위를 가진다는 것을 증명했다.', 'tr': 'Etiketler kynçylyk wahlawatynyň muňanlykyny barlamaga mesele etiket daýratynyň öwrenmesi (LDL) meselesi hökmünde okalýar. Biz agaç-Wasserstein düzgünli LDL algoritmi teklip edip, iýerarhiýa metin klasifikasyonuň uzmanyny üns berýäris. Biz tüm etiket hijerarhiýasyny näyral şebekelerinden ullanýan öňlenmäni teklip edip otyrýarys. Bu ýerde tahmin edilen we dogry etiketler arasynyň meňzeşligi agaç-Wasserstein aralygy bilen ölçüldir. Sintetik we hakyky dünýäde maglumat setirlerini ulanan deneylerden çykyş edip görkezilýän çykyşlar üçin, bu teklip etiketlerniň düzümlerini oňa gowy görýär we bu Sinkörn algoritmi bilen hesaplamak wagty we yada ulanmagy mümkinçiligini görýär.', 'sq': 'Problemi i vlerësimit të shpërndarjes së probabilitetit të etiketave është studiuar gjerësisht si një problem i mësimit të shpërndarjes së etiketave (LDL), aplikimet e të cilëve përfshijnë vlerësimin e moshës, analizën emocionale dhe segmentimin semantik. Ne propozojmë një algoritëm LDL të rregulluar distancën druri-Wasserstein, duke u përqëndruar në detyrat hierarkike të klasifikimit të tekstit. We propose predicting the entire label hierarchy using neural networks, where the similarity between predicted and true labels is measured using the tree-Wasserstein distance.  Nëpërmjet eksperimenteve duke përdorur të dhënat sintetike dhe të botës reale, ne demonstrojmë se metoda e propozuar konsideron me sukses strukturën e etiketave gjatë trajnimit dhe krahasohet favorisht me algoritmin Sinkhorn në lidhje me kohën e llogaritjes dhe përdorimin e kujtesës.', 'af': "Die probleem van die waarskynlike verspreiding van etikette is vaste ondersoek as 'n etiket verspreiding leer (LDL) probleem, wie se toepassings inkluit ouderestimatie, emosie analisie en semantiese segmentasie. Ons voorstel 'n boom- Wasserstein afstand reguliseerde LDL algoritme, fokus op hierarkies teks klasifikasie taak. Ons voorstel om die hele etiket hierarkie te voorskou deur neurale netwerke te gebruik waar die gelykenis tussen voorskoude en waar etikette gemeet word deur die boom- Wasserstein afstand te gebruik. Deur eksperimente gebruik sintetiese en reël wêreld datastelle, wys ons dat die voorgestelde metode suksesvol die struktuur van etikette onderwerp tydens onderwerp, en dit vergelyk genadig met die Sinkhorn algoritme in terms van rekenaar tyd en geheue gebruik.", 'am': 'የፋይል መክፈቻ የደረጃ ማቀናጃ (LDL) ጉዳይ ሆኖ ተማርቷል፡፡ የዛፍ-Wasserstein ግዛት የLDL algoritm መዘጋጀት እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ የኔውራዊ መረብ በመጠቀም የlabel አዳራርክቲቱን እና እውነተኛ ምልክቶች መካከል የዛፍ-Wasserstein ርቀት በመጠቀም የሚመስል እንደሆነ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተፈተና እና እውነተኛ ዓለም ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም፣ በተዘጋጀው ማድረግ የምልክቶችን መሠረት በሙሉ እንዲያሳየው እና በሲንክሮን አልጎሪም በተከበረው ሰዓት እና መታሰቢያ ተጠቃሚ እንዲሆን እናሳያልን፡፡', 'hy': 'Տեպիկների հավանականության բաշխման գնահատման խնդիրը լայնորեն ուսումնասիրել է որպես պիտակների բաշխման ուսումնասիրության խնդիր, որի ծրագրերը ներառում են տարիքի գնահատումը, զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը և սեմանտիկ սերմետացիան: Մենք առաջարկում ենք ծառի և Վասերստեյնի հեռավորության վերահսկվող ԼԴԼ ալգորիթմ, որը կենտրոնացնում է հիերարխիկ տեքստի դասակարգման խնդիրների վրա: Մենք առաջարկում ենք կանխատեսել ամբողջ պիտակների հիերարխիան, օգտագործելով նյարդային ցանցեր, որտեղ կանխատեսված և ճշմարիտ պիտակների նմանությունը չափում է ծառի և Վասերստեյնի հեռավորության միջոցով: Փորձերի միջոցով, օգտագործելով սինթետիկ և իրական աշխարհի տվյալների համակարգեր, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ առաջարկած մեթոդը հաջողությամբ հաշվի առնում է պիտակների կառուցվածքը վարժման ընթացքում, և այն համեմատում է Սինքորնի ալգորիթմի հետ հաշվարկման ժամանակի և հի', 'bs': 'Problem procjene verovatnoće distribucije etiketa je široko proučen kao problem sa učenjem distribucije etiketa (LDL), čije aplikacije uključuju procjenu doba, analizu emocija i semantičku segmentaciju. Predlažemo udaljenost drveta-Wasserstein a regulariziranog LDL algoritma, fokusirajući se na hijerarhijske funkcije klasifikacije teksta. Predlažemo predvidjeti cijelu hijerarhiju etikete koristeći neuralne mreže, gdje se sličnost između predviđenih i pravih etiketa mjera koristeći udaljenost drveta-Wasserstein. Kroz eksperimente koristeći sintetičke i realne svjetske podatke, pokazujemo da je predložena metoda uspješno smatrala strukturu etiketa tijekom treninga, i uspoređuje favoritno sa sinkhorskim algoritmom u smislu računalnog vremena i upotrebe pamćenja.', 'az': 'Etiketlərin ehtimal dağıtımı hesablaması problemi çox böyük bir etiket dağıtımı öyrənməsi (LDL) problemi olaraq təhsil edilmişdir. Uygulamaları yaş hesablaması, emosyon analizi və semantik segmentasiya dahil edilmişdir. Biz a ğac-Wasserstin uzaqlaşdırılmış LDL algoritmi təklif edirik, hiyerarşik metin klasifikasyonu işlərinə odaqlanır. Biz bütün etiket hiyerarşisini tədbir edirik ki, tədbir edilmiş və doğru etiketlərin arasındakı bənzəri ağac-Wasserstein uzağından ölçülür. Sintetik və həqiqi dünya veri qurularını istifadə edən sınaqlar vasitəsilə, təhsil edilmiş metodların təhsil sırasında etiketlərin qurulmasını müvəffəqiyyətlə göründüyünü göstərdik və Sinkhorn algoritmi ilə hesaplama vaxtı və yaddaş istifadəsi ilə müvəffəqiyyəti ilə salır.', 'bn': 'লেবেলের বিতরণের সম্ভাবনা বিতরণ হিসেবে ব্যাপকভাবে গবেষণা করা হয়েছে লেবেল বিতরণ শিক্ষা (LDL) সমস্যা, যার অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের মধ্যে বয়স হিসাব, আবেগ বিশ্লে আমরা একটি গাছ-ওয়াসার্স্টেইন দূরত্ব নিয়ন্ত্রণ করা এল্গোরিদম প্রস্তাব করছি, যা হিয়ারার্কিয়াল টেক্সট ক্লাস্ফিকেশনের কাজের উপর নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে পুরো লেবেল হিয়েরার্কি প্রস্তাব করার প্রস্তাব প্রস্তাব করছি, যেখানে ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী এবং সত্যিকার লেবেলের মধ্ পরীক্ষার মাধ্যমে আমরা প্রমাণ করি যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি সফলভাবে প্রশিক্ষণের সময় লেবেলের কাঠামো বিবেচনা করে এবং এটি সিঙ্কোর্ন অ্যালগরিদমের সাথে গণনার সময় এবং মেমরি ব্যবহারে', 'ca': "El problem a d'estimar la distribució de probabilitats de les etiquetes s'ha estudiat ampliament com un problema d'aprenentatge de distribució d'etiquetes (LDL), les aplicacions dels quals inclouen estimació d'edat, anàlisi emocional i segmentació semàntica. Proposem un algoritme LDL regularitzat a distància arbre-Wasserstein, centrat en tasques de classificació de textos jeràrquiques. Proposem predir tota la jerarquia d'etiquetes fent servir xarxes neurals, on la similitud entre etiquetes predites i veritables es mesura fent servir la distància arbre-Wasserstein. A través d'experiments utilitzant conjunts de dades sintètiques i del món real, demostram que el mètode proposat considera amb èxit l'estructura de les etiquetes durant l'entrenament, i compara favorablement amb l'algoritme Sinkhorn en termes de temps de calcul i ús de memòria.", 'et': 'Märgistuste tõenäosusjaotuse hindamise probleemi on laialdaselt uuritud kui märgistuse jaotusõppe (LDL) probleemi, mille rakendused hõlmavad vanuse hindamist, emotsioonianalüüsi ja semantilist segmenteerimist. Pakume välja puu-Wassersteini kaugusregulariseeritud LDL algoritmi, keskendudes hierarhilisele teksti klassifitseerimisele. Me teeme ettepaneku ennustada kogu sildihierarhia neurovõrkude abil, kus prognoositud ja tegelike sildide sarnasust mõõdetakse puu-Wassersteini kauguse abil. Sünteetiliste ja reaalmaailma andmekogumitega eksperimentide abil näitame, et kavandatud meetod võtab koolituse ajal edukalt arvesse märgiste struktuuri ning võrdleb Sinkhorni algoritmiga soodsalt arvutusaja ja mälukasutuse osas.', 'cs': 'Problém odhadu pravděpodobnosti distribuce štítků byl široce studován jako problém štítků distribuce štítků (LDL), jehož aplikace zahrnují odhad věku, emoční analýzu a sémantickou segmentaci. Navrhujeme strom-Wasserstein distanční regularizovaný LDL algoritmus se zaměřením na hierarchické úlohy klasifikace textu. Navrhujeme předpověď celé hierarchie štítků pomocí neuronových sítí, kde je podobnost mezi predikovanými a skutečnými štítky měřena pomocí stromové-Wassersteinovy vzdálenosti. Prostřednictvím experimentů s využitím syntetických a reálných datových sad demonstrujeme, že navržená metoda úspěšně zohlední strukturu štítků během tréninku a příznivě se porovnává se Sinkhornským algoritmem z hlediska výpočtového času a využití paměti.', 'fi': 'Tarrojen todennäköisyysjakauman arviointiongelmaa on tutkittu laajasti tarrajakauman oppimisongelmana (LDL), jonka sovelluksia ovat ikäarviointi, tunneanalyysi ja semanttinen segmentointi. Ehdotamme puun ja Wassersteinin etäisyysregularisoitua LDL-algoritmia, joka keskittyy hierarkkisiin tekstiluokittelutehtäviin. Ehdotamme koko etikettihierarkian ennustamista neuroverkoilla, joissa ennustettujen ja todellisten etikettien samankaltaisuutta mitataan puun ja Wassersteinin välisellä etäisyydellä. Synteettisiä ja reaalimaailman datakokonaisuuksia hyödyntävillä kokeiluilla osoitetaan, että ehdotettu menetelmä huomioi menestyksekkäästi tunnisteiden rakenteen koulutuksen aikana, ja sitä verrataan suotuisasti Sinkhornin algoritmiin laskentaajan ja muistin käytön osalta.', 'sk': 'Problem ocenjevanja verjetnostne porazdelitve oznak je bil široko raziskan kot problem učenja distribucije oznak (LDL), katerega aplikacije vključujejo ocenjevanje starosti, analizo čustev in semantično segmentacijo. Predlagamo drevesno-Wassersteinov razdaljno urejeni LDL algoritem, ki se osredotoča na hierarhične naloge klasifikacije besedila. Predlagamo napoved celotne hierarhije oznak z uporabo nevronskih omrežij, kjer se podobnost med predvidenimi in resničnimi oznakami meri z uporabo drevesa-Wassersteinove razdalje. S pomočjo poskusov s sintetičnimi in resničnimi nabori podatkov dokazujemo, da predlagana metoda uspešno upošteva strukturo oznak med usposabljanjem in ugodno primerja z algoritmom Sinkhorn v smislu izračunalniškega časa in uporabe pomnilnika.', 'jv': 'Asuran kanggo ngerasakno perusahaan kanggo ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno panganan ingkang merkelas (NLL), supoyo sing gawe ngubah urip nggawe barang dhéwé, edang langgar sampek empatik lan sematik segmentatik. Awak dhéwé ngerasai gambar-Wassnstain langgar algorihm gak nggawe Awak dhéwé ngerti pregungan barang nggambar label kuwi nggambar netwark, win sambarang langgambar nggawe lan alat sing true nggambar nggambar kebutuhan cara-Wass-gestain. Ato hal-hal sing diranggunakake sistem sistem sing senetik lan pakan-barêng dataset anyar, kéné amplazi supoyo supoyo nggawe ngupakan sistem sing etiket dadi nêmên, lan iki dadi supoyo sing paling dhéwé karo hal-upan seneng pisan pangan lan membersaken.', 'he': 'הבעיה של הערכה של ההפצה הסבירות של תוויות למדו באופן רחב כבעיה של לימוד ההפצה של תוויות (LDL), שיתופים כוללים הערכת גיל, ניתוח רגשות, וחלק סמנטי. אנו מציעים אלגוריתם LDL ממוקד מרחק עץ-ווסקרסטין, המתמקד על משימות ההיסטוריה הטקסטית הייררכית. אנחנו מציעים לחזות את כל הייררכיה של התווית באמצעות רשתות עצביות, שבו הדמיון בין התוויות צפויות ואמיתיות מומד באמצעות מרחק העץ-ווסלסטיין. באמצעות ניסויים באמצעות קבוצות נתונים סינטטיות ועולם אמיתי, אנו מראים שהשיטה המוצעת שוקלת בהצלחה את מבנה התוויות במהלך האימון, והיא משוואה באופן טוב עם אלגוריתם סינקורן בנוגע לזמן החישוב ושימוש זיכרון.', 'ha': "QRegExp Tuna goyyar da wata algoritm na LDL da aka ƙayyade daraja-Wassarstanin, yana da makini ga aikin fassarar matsayin. Kana buɗa'a gabatar da shirin layarwa duk da ke amfani da zanen neural, a inda ana ƙayyade daidaita tsakanin wa'adi da alama masu gaske da yin amfani da durin-Wassarstanin. Through experiments using synthetic and real-world datasets, we demonstrate that the proposed method successfully considers the structure of labels during training, and it compares favorably with the Sinkhorn algorithm in terms of computation time and memory usage.", 'bo': 'The problem of estimating the probability distribution of labels has been widely studied as a label distribution learning (LDL) problem, whose applications include age estimation, emotion analysis, and semantic segmentation. We propose a tree-Wasserstein distance regularized LDL algorithm, focusing on hierarchical text classification tasks. We propose predicting the entire label hierarchy using neural networks, where the similarity between predicted and true labels is measured using the tree-Wasserstein distance. Through experiments using synthetic and real-world datasets, we demonstrate that the proposed method successfully considers the structure of labels during training, and it compares favorably with the Sinkhorn algorithm in terms of computation time and memory usage.'}
{'en': 'Have Attention Heads in BERT Learned Constituency Grammar?', 'pt': 'Os chefes de atenção no BERT aprenderam a gramática do grupo constituinte?', 'ar': 'هل لديك رؤساء انتباه في قواعد دائرة BERT المستفادة؟', 'fr': 'Les responsables de l"attention du BERT ont-ils appris la grammaire des circonscriptions\xa0?', 'es': '¿Los jefes de atención en BERT han aprendido gramática de circunscripciones?', 'hi': 'क्या BERT में ध्यान प्रमुखों सीखा निर्वाचन क्षेत्र व्याकरण है?', 'ja': 'BERTの学んだ選挙区文法における注意喚起ヘッドはありますか？', 'zh': 'BERT中有注意力头学语法?', 'ru': 'Внимание Руководители в BERT Изучили Грамматику Округа?', 'ga': 'An bhfuil Aire Airde i nGramadach an Toghlaigh Foghlamtha ag BERT?', 'ka': 'თმა ლთ დლაგთ ჱა გნთმანთვ გ ბვპრ ნასფთლ დპამაპ?', 'hu': 'Van figyelem vezetője a BERT tanult választókerületi nyelvtan?', 'el': 'Έχουν την προσοχή επικεφαλής στη γραμματική του Μπέρτ;', 'it': 'Avere capi di attenzione nella grammatica del collegio scolastico BERT?', 'kk': 'BERT үйренген конституциялық бағандарында назар айдары бар ма?', 'lt': 'Ar BERT dėmesio vadovai išmoko konstitucijos gramos?', 'ms': 'Have Attention Heads in BERT Learned Constituency Grammar?', 'mk': 'Дали главите на вниманието во БЕРТ научија грама за уставност?', 'mn': 'БЕРТ-д анхаарлын удирдагчид сурсан байгууллагын эмэгтэйчүүд байдаг уу?', 'no': 'Har oppmerkshovud i BERT lærte konstitusjonsgrammar?', 'mt': 'Have Attention Heads in BERT Learned Constituency Grammar?', 'ml': 'ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയില്\u200d പഠിച്ച കാര്യത്തിന്\u200dറെ ഗ്രാമ്മറില്\u200d തലക്കുകള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നുണ്ടോ?', 'ro': 'Au șefi de atenție în BERT învățat gramatica electorală?', 'si': 'BERT ඉගෙන ගත්ත ස්ථානය ග්\u200dරාම්මාර් වල අවධානයක් තියෙනවද?', 'sr': 'Imaju li glave pažnje u BERT-u naučili Grammar konstitucije?', 'so': 'Hey Heads in BERT Learned Constitution Grammar?', 'ta': 'பெர்ட் படிக்கப்பட்ட தலைப்புகளில் கவனம் இருக்க வேண்டுமா?', 'ur': 'BERT سکھایا گیا سائنسٹنسیٹ گرامر میں حوادث ہے؟', 'pl': 'Czy uwaga głowy w BERT Learned Constituency Grammar?', 'sv': 'Har uppmärksamhet huvuden i BERT lärt sig valkrets grammatik?', 'vi': 'Các giáo viên tập trung học xây dựng Grammar?', 'uz': "BERT ta'minlovchi katta darajadagi taʼminlovchi sarlavhalar bor?", 'bg': 'Имате ли ръководители на вниманието в Берт научили ли са граматика на избирателите?', 'hr': 'Imaju li glave pažnje u BERT-u naučili Grammar konstitucije?', 'da': 'Har opmærksomhed hoveder i BERT lærte valgkreds grammatik?', 'nl': 'Hebben Attentie Heads in BERT Learned Constituency Grammar?', 'ko': '버트의 주의력 집중자는 선택 문법을 배운 적이 있습니까?', 'de': 'Haben Attention Heads in BERT Learned Constituency Grammar?', 'fa': 'رئيس توجه در برت مادربزرگ سازمان ياد گرفته؟', 'id': 'Apakah kepala perhatian di BERT Belajar Constituency Grammar?', 'tr': 'BERT Öwrenmiş durmuşy Grammatda Attention Headers barmy?', 'af': 'Het aanmerking koppe in BERT geleer konstituency Grammar?', 'sq': 'A kanë kryesorët e vëmendjes në BERT Mësuar Grama e Kushtetueshmërisë?', 'hy': 'Արդյո՞ք ուշադրության գլխավորները BER-ում սովորել են սահմանադրական գրամար:', 'sw': 'Je, ina hadhira ya vichwa vya habari katika Gramu ya Kikatiba ya BERT?', 'am': 'የBERT የተማረ ዋነኛ ኮምፕሬማር አናት ላይ ተጠያቂዎች አሉት?', 'bn': 'বের্ট শিক্ষিত সংবিধান গ্রামারের শিক্ষার্থীদের হেড দেখা যায়?', 'az': 'BERT Öyrəndiyi Konstituasyon Grammar ında Attention Heads var mı?', 'bs': 'Imaju li glave pažnje u BERT-u naučili Grammar konstitucije?', 'cs': 'Mají pozornost hlavy v BERT Learned Constituency Grammar?', 'fi': 'Onko huomion johtajat BERT Oppinut vaalipiirin kielioppi?', 'et': 'Kas tähelepanu pead BERT õppinud valimisringkonna grammatika?', 'ca': "Tenim cap d'atenció a BERT Apprendit Constituency Grammar?", 'he': 'Have Attention Heads in BERT Learned Constituency Grammar?', 'sk': 'Ali so se vodje pozornosti v BERT naučili slovnice volilnih enot?', 'ha': 'Haka kula Head cikin BERT Mai Learn Title Grammar?', 'bo': 'BERT སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་རྩ་བའི་ཚད་ལྡོག་ནང་ལ་གནད་དོན་མཁན་ཡོད་མིན་ནམ།', 'jv': 'Ha'}
{'en': 'With the success of pre-trained language models in recent years, more and more researchers focus on opening the black box of these models. Following this interest, we carry out a qualitative and quantitative analysis of constituency grammar in attention heads of BERT and RoBERTa. We employ the syntactic distance method to extract implicit constituency grammar from the attention weights of each head. Our results show that there exist heads that can induce some grammar types much better than baselines, suggesting that some heads act as a proxy for constituency grammar. We also analyze how attention heads’ constituency grammar inducing (CGI) ability changes after fine-tuning with two kinds of tasks, including sentence meaning similarity (SMS) tasks and natural language inference (NLI) tasks. Our results suggest that SMS tasks decrease the average CGI ability of upper layers, while NLI tasks increase it. Lastly, we investigate the connections between CGI ability and natural language understanding ability on QQP and MNLI tasks.', 'ar': 'مع نجاح نماذج اللغة المدربة مسبقًا في السنوات الأخيرة ، يركز المزيد والمزيد من الباحثين على فتح "الصندوق الأسود" لهذه النماذج. بعد هذا الاهتمام ، نجري تحليلًا نوعيًا وكميًا لقواعد الدوائر الانتخابية في انتباه رؤساء BERT و RoBERTa. نحن نستخدم طريقة المسافة النحوية لاستخراج القواعد النحوية الضمنية من أوزان الانتباه لكل رأس. تظهر نتائجنا أن هناك أفكارًا يمكن أن تحفز بعض أنواع القواعد بشكل أفضل بكثير من الخطوط الأساسية ، مما يشير إلى أن بعض الرؤوس تعمل كبديل لقواعد القواعد. نحن نحلل أيضًا كيف تتغير قدرة تحفيز القواعد النحوية (CGI) لرؤساء الانتباه بعد ضبط نوعين من المهام ، بما في ذلك مهام تشابه المعنى (SMS) ومهام استدلال اللغة الطبيعية (NLI). تشير نتائجنا إلى أن مهام الرسائل القصيرة تقلل من متوسط قدرة CGI للطبقات العليا ، بينما تزيد مهام NLI ذلك. أخيرًا ، نتحرى الروابط بين قدرة CGI والقدرة على فهم اللغة الطبيعية في مهام QQP و MNLI.', 'es': 'Con el éxito de los modelos lingüísticos previamente entrenados en los últimos años, cada vez más investigadores se centran en abrir la «caja negra» de estos modelos. Siguiendo este interés, realizamos un análisis cualitativo y cuantitativo de la gramática de las circunscripciones en los jefes de atención de BERT y RobErta. Empleamos el método de la distancia sintáctica para extraer la gramática implícita de la circunscripción electoral de los pesos de atención de cada cabeza. Nuestros resultados muestran que existen cabezas que pueden inducir algunos tipos de gramática mucho mejor que las líneas de base, lo que sugiere que algunas cabezas actúan como un sustituto de la gramática de la circunscripción. También analizamos cómo cambia la capacidad de inducir gramática (CGI) de los jefes de atención después de ajustar con precisión dos tipos de tareas, incluidas las tareas de similitud de significado de oraciones (SMS) y las tareas de inferencia de lenguaje natural (NLI). Nuestros resultados sugieren que las tareas de SMS disminuyen la capacidad CGI promedio de las capas superiores, mientras que las tareas de NLI la aumentan. Por último, investigamos las conexiones entre la capacidad de CGI y la capacidad de comprensión del lenguaje natural en las tareas de QQP y MNLI.', 'pt': 'Com o sucesso dos modelos de linguagem pré-treinados nos últimos anos, cada vez mais pesquisadores se concentram em abrir a “caixa preta” desses modelos. Seguindo este interesse, realizamos uma análise qualitativa e quantitativa da gramática de constituinte em chefes de atenção de BERT e RoBERTa. Empregamos o método da distância sintática para extrair gramática implícita de constituintes dos pesos de atenção de cada núcleo. Nossos resultados mostram que existem núcleos que podem induzir alguns tipos de gramática muito melhor do que linhas de base, sugerindo que alguns núcleos atuam como proxy para gramática de constituinte. Também analisamos como a habilidade de indução gramatical (CGI) dos chefes de atenção muda após o ajuste fino com dois tipos de tarefas, incluindo tarefas de similaridade de significado de sentença (SMS) e tarefas de inferência de linguagem natural (NLI). Nossos resultados sugerem que as tarefas de SMS diminuem a capacidade média de CGI das camadas superiores, enquanto as tarefas de NLI a aumentam. Por fim, investigamos as conexões entre a capacidade de CGI e a capacidade de compreensão de linguagem natural em tarefas de QQP e MNLI.', 'fr': "Avec le succès des modèles linguistiques pré-formés ces dernières années, de plus en plus de chercheurs se concentrent sur l'ouverture de la «\xa0boîte noire\xa0» de ces modèles. Suite à cet intérêt, nous effectuons une analyse qualitative et quantitative de la grammaire des circonscriptions dans les têtes d'attention du BERT et de Roberta. Nous utilisons la méthode de la distance syntaxique pour extraire la grammaire implicite de constituants des poids d'attention de chaque tête. Nos résultats montrent qu'il existe des têtes qui peuvent induire certains types de grammaire bien mieux que les lignes de base, ce qui suggère que certaines têtes agissent comme un substitut de la grammaire de circonscription. Nous analysons également comment la capacité d'induction de la grammaire des circonscriptions (CGI) des têtes d'attention change après avoir peaufiné deux types de tâches, y compris les tâches de similarité de signification de phrases (SMS) et les tâches d'inférence en langage naturel (NLI). Nos résultats suggèrent que les tâches SMS diminuent la capacité CGI moyenne des couches supérieures, tandis que les tâches NLI l'augmentent. Enfin, nous étudions les liens entre la capacité CGI et la capacité de compréhension du langage naturel dans les tâches QQP et MNLI.", 'zh': '近年预训言模之成,益多者专注于开黑匣子。 以此兴,BERTRoBERTa注意语法定性定量分析。 余以句法去法从头意权重取隐式区语法。 吾之的结果表明,有似于基线者,有似于语法者,有似于选语法者。 又论注意之选语法诱(CGI)能在微调(兼句意相似性(SMS)与自然语言推理(NLI))后如何变化。 吾之的结果表明,SMS务损上均CGI能,而NLI务增CGI能。 究QQPMNLI之任CGI与自然语言理解能力相连。', 'ja': '近年、事前にトレーニングされた言語モデルの成功により、これらのモデルの「ブラックボックス」を開くことに焦点を当てる研究者が増えています。 この関心に続いて、BERTとRoBERTaの責任者に注目して、選挙区文法の定性的および定量的分析を行います。 各頭部の注意重みから暗黙の選挙区文法を抽出するために構文距離法を使用します。 我々の結果は、ベースラインよりもはるかに優れた文法タイプを誘導できるヘッドが存在することを示しており、一部のヘッドが選挙区文法の代用として機能することを示唆しています。 また、文の意味の類似性（ SMS ）タスクと自然言語推論（ NLI ）タスクを含む2種類のタスクで微調整した後の、視聴者層の文法誘導（ CGI ）能力の注意力の変化を分析します。 私たちの結果は、SMSタスクは上位層の平均CGI能力を低下させ、NLIタスクはそれを増加させることを示唆しています。 最後に、QQPとMNLIタスクにおけるCGI能力と自然言語理解能力の関連を調査します。', 'hi': 'हाल के वर्षों में पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल की सफलता के साथ, अधिक से अधिक शोधकर्ताइन मॉडलों के "ब्लैक बॉक्स" को खोलने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। इस रुचि के बाद, हम BERT और RoBERTa के ध्यान प्रमुखों में निर्वाचन क्षेत्र व्याकरण का एक गुणात्मक और मात्रात्मक विश्लेषण करते हैं। हम प्रत्येक सिर के ध्यान वजन से निहित निर्वाचन क्षेत्र व्याकरण निकालने के लिए वाक्यात्मक दूरी विधि को नियोजित करते हैं। हमारे परिणाम बताते हैं कि ऐसे प्रमुख मौजूद हैं जो कुछ व्याकरण प्रकारों को बेसलाइन की तुलना में बेहतर तरीके से प्रेरित कर सकते हैं, यह सुझाव देते हुए कि कुछ प्रमुख निर्वाचन क्षेत्र व्याकरण के लिए प्रॉक्सी के रूप में कार्य करते हैं। हम यह भी विश्लेषण करते हैं कि दो प्रकार के कार्यों के साथ ठीक-ट्यूनिंग के बाद ध्यान प्रमुखों की निर्वाचन क्षेत्र व्याकरण उत्प्रेरण (सीजीआई) क्षमता कैसे बदलती है, जिसमें वाक्य अर्थ समानता (एसएमएस) कार्य और प्राकृतिक भाषा अनुमान (एनएलआई) कार्य शामिल हैं। हमारे परिणाम बताते हैं कि एसएमएस कार्य ऊपरी परतों की औसत सीजीआई क्षमता को कम करते हैं, जबकि एनएलआई कार्य इसे बढ़ाते हैं। अंत में, हम QQP और MNLI कार्यों पर CGI क्षमता और प्राकृतिक भाषा समझने की क्षमता के बीच कनेक्शन की जांच करते हैं।', 'ru': 'С успехом предварительно обученных языковых моделей в последние годы все больше исследователей сосредоточивают внимание на открытии «черного ящика» этих моделей. Следуя этому интересу, мы проводим качественный и количественный анализ грамматики избирательных округов в главах внимания BERT и RoBERTa. Мы используем метод синтаксического расстояния для извлечения неявной грамматики избирательных округов из весов внимания каждой головы. Наши результаты показывают, что существуют головы, которые могут индуцировать некоторые типы грамматики намного лучше, чем базовые линии, предполагая, что некоторые головы действуют как прокси для грамматики избирательного округа. Мы также анализируем, как изменяется способность стимулирования грамматики избирательных округов (CGI) глав внимания после тонкой настройки двух видов задач, включая задачи сходства смысла предложения (SMS) и задачи вывода естественного языка (NLI). Наши результаты показывают, что SMS-задачи снижают среднюю CGI-способность верхних слоев, а NLI-задачи увеличивают ее. Наконец, мы исследуем связи между способностью CGI и способностью понимать естественный язык в задачах QQP и MNLI.', 'ga': 'Leis an rath a bhí ar mhúnlaí teanga réamhoilte le blianta beaga anuas, tá níos mó agus níos mó taighdeoirí ag díriú ar “bhosca dubh” na múnlaí seo a oscailt. Ag leanúint leis an spéis seo, déanaimid anailís cháilíochtúil agus chainníochtúil ar ghramadach na dtoghlach i gceannairí aird BERT agus RoBERTa. Bainimid úsáid as modh an achair chomhréire chun gramadach toghlaigh intuigthe a bhaint as meáchain airde gach cloigeann. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí go bhfuil cinn ann a d’fhéadfadh roinnt cineálacha gramadaí a aslú i bhfad níos fearr ná na bunlínte, rud a thugann le tuiscint go bhfeidhmíonn cinn áirithe mar sheachvótálaí do ghramadach an toghlaigh. Déanaimid anailís freisin ar an gcaoi a n-athraíonn cumas ionduchtaithe gramadaí toghlaigh (CGI) ceannairí aird tar éis mionchoigeartú a dhéanamh ar dhá chineál tascanna, lena n-áirítear tascanna cosúlachta brí abairtí (SMS) agus tascanna tátail nádúrtha teanga (NLI). Tugann ár dtorthaí le tuiscint go laghdaíonn tascanna SMS meánchumas CGI na sraitheanna uachtaracha, agus go méadaíonn tascanna LNÉ é. Ar deireadh, déanaimid imscrúdú ar na naisc idir cumas CGI agus cumas tuisceana teanga nádúrtha ar thascanna QQP agus MNLI.', 'ka': "ბოლო წლის წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენით წარმოდგენით უფრო მეტი მეცნიერებელი ამ მოდელების 'შავი კოსტი' გახსნა. ამ ინტერესტის შემდეგ ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ კვალტატიური და კვალტატიური ანალიზი, რომელიც გავაკეთებთ ბერტი და პრობერტის მისამართლეში. ჩვენ ვაყენებთ სინტაქტიკური განტოლების მიზეზი, რომელიც ყოველ თავიდან ინფლისტიური კონსტუტენტიკური გრამატურის გამოყენება. ჩვენი წარმოდგენები აჩვენებენ, რომ არსებობს თავისუფლები, რომლებიც შეუძლიათ გავაკეთოთ რამდენიმე გრამატური ტიპები უფრო უკეთესი, ვიდრე ბაზის ხაზები, რომ ჩვენ ასევე ვაანალიზებთ, როგორ აღმოჩენების გარეშე გრამეტური გრამეტურის შესაძლებლობა (CGI) შესაძლებლობა შეცვლა ორი ტიპის დავალებით, როგორც სიტყვების ნიშნავს სხვადასხვა (SMS) დავალებები და ნახვადასხვა ენ ჩვენი წარმოდგენების შესახებ, რომ SMS დავალებები საშუალო სინამდვილეების სინამდვილეების სინამდვილეების სინამდვილეების შესაძლებლობას გააკეთება, როცა საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ შევხედავთ CGI შესაძლებლობა და ნახვა ენის შესაძლებლობა QQP და MNLI სამუშაოში.", 'el': 'Με την επιτυχία των προ-εκπαιδευμένων γλωσσικών μοντέλων τα τελευταία χρόνια, όλο και περισσότεροι ερευνητές επικεντρώνονται στο άνοιγμα του "μαύρου κουτιού" αυτών των μοντέλων. Ακολουθώντας αυτό το ενδιαφέρον, διεξάγουμε ποιοτική και ποσοτική ανάλυση της γραμματικής εκλογικής περιφέρειας σε επικεφαλής προσοχής του BERT και του RoBERTa. Χρησιμοποιούμε τη μέθοδο συντακτικής απόστασης για να εξάγουμε τη σιωπηρή γραμματική εκλογικής περιφέρειας από τα βάρη προσοχής κάθε κεφαλιού. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ότι υπάρχουν κεφάλια που μπορούν να προκαλέσουν κάποιους τύπους γραμματικής πολύ καλύτερα από τις γραμμές βάσης, υποδηλώνοντας ότι ορισμένα κεφάλια δρουν ως αντιπρόσωπος της γραμματικής εκλογικής περιφέρειας. Αναλύουμε επίσης τον τρόπο με τον οποίο αλλάζει η ικανότητα επαγωγής γραμματικής εκλογικής περιφέρειας των κεφαλών προσοχής μετά τον συντονισμό με δύο είδη εργασιών, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των εργασιών που σημαίνουν ομοιότητα των προτάσεων και των εργασιών συμπερασμάτων φυσικής γλώσσας. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ότι οι εργασίες μειώνουν τη μέση ικανότητα των ανώτερων στρωμάτων, ενώ οι εργασίες την αυξάνουν. Τέλος, διερευνούμε τις συνδέσεις μεταξύ της ικανότητας και της ικανότητας κατανόησης φυσικής γλώσσας σε εργασίες QQP και MNLI.', 'hu': 'Az elmúlt években az előképzett nyelvi modellek sikerének köszönhetően egyre több kutató összpontosít e modellek "fekete dobozának" megnyitására. Ezt az érdeklődést követően a BERT és RoBERTa figyelemvezetőinek minőségi és kvantitatív nyelvtani elemzését végezzük. A szintaktikus távolság módszert alkalmazzuk az implicit választókerületi nyelvtan kivonására minden fej figyelemsúlyából. Eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy léteznek olyan fejek, amelyek sokkal jobban indukálhatnak bizonyos nyelvtani típusokat, mint a kiindulási vonalak, ami arra utal, hogy egyes fejek a választókerületi nyelvtan helyettesítőjeként működnek. Azt is elemezzük, hogyan változik a figyelemfejek választókerületi nyelvtani indukáló (CGI) képessége kétféle feladat finomhangolása után, beleértve a mondat jelentése hasonlóság (SMS) feladatokat és a természetes nyelvi következtetés (NLI) feladatokat. Eredményeink azt sugallják, hogy az SMS feladatok csökkentik a felső rétegek átlagos CGI képességét, míg az NLI feladatok növelik azt. Végül megvizsgáljuk a CGI képesség és a természetes nyelvértési képesség közötti kapcsolatokat QQP és MNLI feladatokban.', 'kk': "Соңғы жылдарда алдын- ала оқылған тіл үлгілерінің сәттілігі арқылы, зерттеушілер осы үлгілердің 'қара куәлігін' ашу үшін көп жұмыс істейді. Бұл қызықтың соңында, BERT және RoBERTa бағыттарының негізделікті және санативті грамматикасын анализ етіп тұрмыз. Біз синтактикалық қашықтық әдісін әрбір басының қашықтығынан шығару үшін көпшілікті грамматиканы шығару әдісін қолданамыз. Біздің нәтижелеріміз бір грамматикалық түрлерді негізгі сызықтардан артық түрлеріне көп жақсы көмектесе алатын бағалар бар дегенді көрсетеді. Кейбір бағалар грамматикалық көмектес Біз сондай-ақ қатар біз бақылау бағдарламалардың бақылау грамматикасы (CGI) қалай екі түрлі тапсырмаларды баптаудан кейін өзгерту мүмкіндігін анализирамыз, мәліметтің ұқсастығы (SMS) тапсырмаларды және табиғ Біздің нәтижелеріміз SMS тапсырмаларының орташа CGI жоғары қабаттардың мүмкіндігін азайтады, NLI тапсырмаларының орташа үлкен болғанда. Соңында, QQP және MNLI тапсырмаларындағы CGI мүмкіндіктері мен табиғи тілдерді түсіндіру мүмкіндіктері арасындағы байланыстарды зерттейміз.", 'ms': "With the success of pre-trained language models in recent years, more and more researchers focus on opening the 'black box' of these models.  Setelah kepentingan ini, kita melakukan analisis kualitatif dan kuantitatif grammar constituency dalam kepala perhatian BERT dan RoBERTa. Kami menggunakan kaedah jarak sintaktik untuk mengekstrak grammar konstitusi implicit dari berat perhatian setiap kepala. Hasil kita menunjukkan bahawa terdapat kepala yang boleh mengakibatkan beberapa jenis grammar jauh lebih baik daripada garis dasar, menyarankan bahawa beberapa kepala bertindak sebagai proksi untuk grammar constituency. Kami juga menganalisis bagaimana grammar pemilik kepala perhatian mengandungi kemampuan (CGI) berubah selepas penyesuaian dengan dua jenis tugas, termasuk tugas kalimat yang bermakna persamaan (SMS) dan kesimpulan bahasa semulajadi (NLI). Our results suggest that SMS tasks decrease the average CGI ability of upper layers, while NLI tasks increase it.  Akhirnya, kami menyelidiki sambungan antara kemampuan CGI dan kemampuan pemahaman bahasa alam pada tugas QQP dan MNLI.", 'lt': "With the success of pre-trained language models in recent years, more and more researchers focus on opening the 'black box' of these models.  Following this interest, we carry out a qualitative and quantitative analysis of constituency grammar in attention heads of BERT and RoBERTa.  Mes naudojame sintaksinio atstumo metodą, kad ištrauktume implicit ų rinkimų apygardos gramatiką iš kiekvienos galvos dėmesio svorio. Our results show that there exist heads that can induce some grammar types much better than baselines, suggesting that some heads act as a proxy for constituency grammar.  Taip pat analizuojame, kaip dėmesio vadovų rinkimų apygardos gramatiką skatinantys gebėjimai (CGI) pasikeičia, suderinus su dviejų rūšių užduotimis, įskaitant sakinius, kurie reiškia panašumą (SMS) užduotis ir gamtinių kalbų išvadas (NLI). Our results suggest that SMS tasks decrease the average CGI ability of upper layers, while NLI tasks increase it.  Galiausiai mes tiriame ryšius tarp CGI gebėjimo ir natūralaus kalbos supratimo gebėjimo QQP ir MNLI užduočių srityje.", 'mk': "With the success of pre-trained language models in recent years, more and more researchers focus on opening the 'black box' of these models.  По овој интерес, спроведуваме квалитетна и квантитивна анализа на граматиката на изборниот округ во внимание на шефовите на Берт и Роберта. We employ the syntactic distance method to extract implicit constituency grammar from the attention weights of each head.  Our results show that there exist heads that can induce some grammar types much better than baselines, suggesting that some heads act as a proxy for constituency grammar.  Ние, исто така, анализираме како граматиката на главите на изборниот округ индукционира (CGI) способност се менува по финетирање со два вида задачи, вклучувајќи ги и задачите на речениците кои значат сличност (SMS) и природна инференција на јазикот (NLI). Our results suggest that SMS tasks decrease the average CGI ability of upper layers, while NLI tasks increase it.  На крајот, ги истражуваме врските помеѓу способноста на ЦГИ и способноста за разбирање на природниот јазик на задачите на ККП и МНЛИ.", 'it': 'Con il successo dei modelli linguistici pre-formati negli ultimi anni, sempre più ricercatori si concentrano sull\'apertura della "scatola nera" di questi modelli. Seguendo questo interesse, effettuiamo un\'analisi qualitativa e quantitativa della grammatica elettorale nei responsabili dell\'attenzione di BERT e RoBERTa. Impieghiamo il metodo sintattico della distanza per estrarre la grammatica elettorale implicita dai pesi di attenzione di ogni testa. I nostri risultati mostrano che esistono teste che possono indurre alcuni tipi di grammatica molto meglio delle linee base, suggerendo che alcune teste fungono da proxy per la grammatica elettorale. Analizziamo anche come cambia l\'abilità di induzione grammaticale (CGI) dei capi di attenzione dopo aver perfezionato due tipi di attività, tra cui attività di somiglianza di significato delle frasi (SMS) e attività di inferenza del linguaggio naturale (NLI). I nostri risultati suggeriscono che le attività SMS riducono la capacità CGI media dei livelli superiori, mentre le attività NLI la aumentano. Infine, esaminiamo le connessioni tra capacità CGI e capacità di comprensione del linguaggio naturale sulle attività QQP e MNLI.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн жилийн өмнө сургалтын хэл загварын амжилтын тулд олон судлаачид эдгээр загварын хар хайрцаг нээхэд анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Энэ сонирхолтой дараа бид БЕРТ болон РОБЕРТА-ын удирдагчдын хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний шинжилгээ хийдэг. Бид бүгдийн анхаарлын хэмжээсүүдээс хамааралтай хэмжээсүүдийг татах синтактикийн зай аргыг ашигладаг. Бидний үр дүнд хэдэн грамматикийн төрлүүдийг суурь шулуунаас илүү сайжруулж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна. Зарим толгой нь байгууллагын грамматикийн прокси гэж ажиллаж чадна. Мөн бид анхаарлын удирдагч байгууллагын грамматик (CGI) байгууллагын дараа хоёр төрлийн даалгавартай холбоотой ажлыг хэрхэн өөрчилж байгааг шинжилгээ хийдэг. Үүний утга нь тэнцүү (SMS) үйл ажиллагаа, байгалийн хэл халдвар (NLI) үйл Бидний үр дүнд SMS ажиллагааны дундаж CGI давхар давхар чадварыг багасгаж, NLI ажиллагаа үүнийг нэмэгдүүлж байна. Эцэст нь бид CGI чадвар болон байгалийн хэл ойлгох чадварын хооронд QQP болон MNLI ажлын холбоотой холбоотой байдлыг судалж байна.', 'pl': 'Wraz z sukcesem wstępnie przeszkolonych modeli językowych w ostatnich latach coraz więcej badaczy skupia się na otwarciu "czarnej skrzynki" tych modeli. W związku z tym zainteresowaniem przeprowadzamy analizę jakościową i ilościową gramatyki okręgowej u szefów uwagi BERT i RoBERTa. Stosujemy metodę odległości składni, aby wyodrębnić ukrytą gramatykę okręgu wyborczego z wag uwagi każdej głowy. Nasze wyniki pokazują, że istnieją głowy, które mogą indukować niektóre typy gramatyki znacznie lepiej niż linie bazowe, sugerując, że niektóre głowy działają jako zastępca gramatyki okręgu wyborczego. Analizujemy również, w jaki sposób zmieniają się umiejętności wywoływania gramatyki (CGI) głów uwagi po dostrojeniu dwóch rodzajów zadań, w tym zadań znaczących podobieństwo zdań (SMS) i zadań wnioskowania języka naturalnego (NLI). Nasze wyniki sugerują, że zadania SMS zmniejszają średnią zdolność CGI górnych warstw, podczas gdy zadania NLI ją zwiększają. Na koniec badamy związki między umiejętnościami CGI a umiejętnością rozumienia języka naturalnego w zadaniach QQP i MNLI.', 'ml': "അടുത്ത വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളില്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളുടെ വിജയം കൊണ്ട്, കൂടുതല്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കുന്നവര്\u200d ഈ മോഡലുകളില്\u200d 'കറുത്ത പെട ഈ താല്പര്യത്തിന് ശേഷം ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെയും റോബെര്\u200dട്ടായുടെയും തലവന്\u200dമാരുടെ എല്ലാ തലയുടെയും തൂക്കങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്താനുള്ള സിന്\u200dടാക്റ്റിക്ക് ദൂരത്തിന്\u200dറെ രീതിയില്\u200d നാം ഉപയോഗി നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു കുറച്ച് ഗ്രാമാര്\u200d തലകള്\u200d ബേസ്റ്റലൈനുകളെക്കാള്\u200d ഉത്തമമാക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു. ച നമ്മള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു എങ്ങനെയാണ് തലവന്മാരുടെ സംസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ ഗ്രാമാര്\u200d തുടങ്ങുന്നതെന്ന്. രണ്ടു തരം ജോലികളുടെ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ശേഷം മാറ്റുന്നത്. വാക്ക നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കുന്നത് SMS ജോലികള്\u200d മുകളിലുള്ള സിജിയിലെ സാധാരണ കഴിവ് കുറവാക്കുന്നു എന്\u200dലിയിലെ  Lastly, we investigate the connections between CGI ability and natural language understanding ability on QQP and MNLI tasks.", 'mt': "With the success of pre-trained language models in recent years, more and more researchers focus on opening the 'black box' of these models.  Wara dan l-interess, nagħmlu analiżi kwalitattiva u kwantitattiva tal-grammar tal-kostitwenza fil-kapijiet tal-attenzjoni tal-BERT u RoBERTa. Aħna nużaw il-metodu tad-distanza sintattika biex neħħew il-grammar impliċitu tal-kostitwenza mill-piżijiet tal-attenzjoni ta’ kull ras. Ir-riżultati tagħna juru li jeżistu kapijiet li jistgħu jinduċu xi tipi ta’ grammatika ħafna a ħjar mil-linji bażi, li jissuġġerixxu li xi kapijiet jaġixxu bħala prokura għall-grammatika tal-kostitwenza. Aħna nianalizzaw ukoll kif il-ħiliet tal-kapijiet tal-attenzjoni li jinduċu l-grammatika tal-kostitwenza (CGI) jinbidlu wara l-irfinar b’żewġ tipi ta’ kompiti, inklużi kompiti ta’ sentenza li jfissru similarità (SMS) u kompiti ta’ inferenza lingwistika naturali (NLI). Our results suggest that SMS tasks decrease the average CGI ability of upper layers, while NLI tasks increase it.  Fl-aħħar nett, ninvestigaw il-konnessjonijiet bejn il-ħila tas-CGI u l-ħila tal-fehim naturali tal-lingwa dwar il-kompiti QQP u MNLI.", 'no': 'Med suksess på føretrainerte språkkmodeller i siste år, fokuserer fleire og fleire forskere på å opna «svart boks» av desse modelane. Etter denne interessen gjer vi ein kvalitativ og kvantitativ analyse av konstitusjonsgrammar i oppmerkshovud av BERT og RoBERTa. Vi bruker syntaksisk avstandsmetoden for å pakka ut implisitt konstitusjonsgrammar frå oppmerksvektene på kvar hod. Resultatet våre viser at det finst hoder som kan indusera nokre grammatikk mykje bedre enn baselinjer, som tyder på at nokre hoder fungerer som mellomtenar for konstitusjonsgrammar. Vi analyserer også korleis oppmerksomhetsgramma for oppmerksomhetsgramma (CGI) endrar kapasiteten etter å finne oppgåver med to typar oppgåver, inkludert setningar som betyr liknande oppgåver (SMS) og naturspråk-infeksjon (NLI). Resultatet våra tyder på at SMS-oppgåver reduserer gjennomsnittlige CGI-kapasiteten for øvre lag, mens NLI-oppgåver øker det. Etter slutt, vi undersøker tilkoplingane mellom CGI-kapasiteten og naturspråk-forståking på QQP og MNLI-oppgåver.', 'si': 'අන්තිම අවුරුදු වලින් ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු භාෂා මොඩල් එක්ක සාර්ථක විදියට, තව ගොඩක් පරීක්ෂකයෝ මේ මොඩල් එකේ කළ මේ විශේෂයෙන් පස්සේ අපි බෙර්ට් සහ RoBERTa වල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා. අපි හැම ඔළුවෙක්ම අවධානයක් ගැන අවධානය කරන්න සංකේතික දුරස්ථ විධානය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. අපේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර අපි ඒවගේම විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා කොහොමද අවධානයක් ඔලුවන්ගේ ප්\u200dරධානය ග්\u200dරාමාර්මාර්කිය (CGI) ප්\u200dරධානයක් වෙනස් කරනවා ප්\u200dරධානයක් දෙකක් වගේ වැඩක අපේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200d අන්තිමට, අපි CGI ක්\u200dරියාත්මක සහ ස්වභාවික භාෂාවට QQP සහ MNLI ක්\u200dරියාත්මක සම්බන්ධයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා.', 'sr': 'Sa uspjehom predobučenih jezičkih modela u poslednjih godina, više istraživača se fokusiraju na otvaranje "crne kutije" ovih modela. Nakon ovog interesa, provodimo kvalitativnu i kvantitativnu analizu gramatike predstavljanja u pozornim glavama BERT i RoBERTa. Koristimo sintaktičnu metodu udaljenosti da izvučemo implicitnu gramatiku predstavnosti iz težine pažnje svake glave. Naši rezultati pokazuju da postoje glave koje mogu izazvati neke gramatičke vrste mnogo bolje od početnih linija, sugerirajući da neki glave djeluju kao proksi za gramatiku konstitucija. Takođe analiziramo kako se gramatika predstavljanja pozornosti glave predstavlja (CGI) promena sposobnosti nakon finalnog prilagodbe sa dve vrste zadataka, uključujući rečenicu koja znači sličnost (SMS) zadataka i prirodne jezičke infekcije (NLI) zadataka. Naši rezultati ukazuju na to da SMS zadatke smanjuju prosječnu sposobnost CGI gornjeg sloja, dok je zadatak NLI povećava. Na kraju, istražujemo veze između sposobnosti CGI-a i sposobnosti razumevanja prirodnog jezika o zadatku QQP-a i MNLI-a.', 'ro': 'Odată cu succesul modelelor lingvistice pre-instruite în ultimii ani, tot mai mulți cercetători se concentrează pe deschiderea "cutiei negre" a acestor modele. Urmând acest interes, efectuăm o analiză calitativă și cantitativă a gramaticii circumscripției la șefii atenției BERT și RoBERTa. Utilizăm metoda distanței sintactice pentru a extrage gramatica implicită a circumscripției din greutățile atenției fiecărui cap. Rezultatele noastre arată că există capete care pot induce unele tipuri de gramatică mult mai bune decât liniile de bază, sugerând că unele capete acționează ca un proxy pentru gramatica circumscripției. De asemenea, analizăm modul în care abilitățile de inducere a gramaticii de circumscripție (CGI) ale șefilor atenției se schimbă după ajustarea fină cu două tipuri de sarcini, inclusiv sarcini de similitudine a semnificației frazelor (SMS) și sarcini de inferență a limbajului natural (NLI). Rezultatele noastre sugerează că sarcinile SMS scad capacitatea CGI medie a straturilor superioare, în timp ce sarcinile NLI o cresc. În cele din urmă, investigăm conexiunile dintre capacitatea CGI și capacitatea de înțelegere a limbajului natural pe sarcinile QQP și MNLI.', 'so': "Markii guulaystay samooyinkii afka hore ee la tababaray sanadkii ugu dambeeyey, waxbarasho badan iyo kuwa badan ayaa ku kalsoonaaday inay furtaan tusaaladahaas 'sanduuqii madow' ah. Kharashkaas kadib waxaynu sameynaa baaritaanka kooban iyo qiyaastiisa ee koontarooyinka ee madaxa BERT iyo RoBERTA. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa qaababka safarka ee la soconayo si aan u soo bixino grammarka cadaanshaha iyo miisaanka miisaanka madax walba. Abaalkayaga waxaa tusinaya inay jiraan madaxyo ka wanaagsan noocyo cajimicsi ah oo ka wanaagsan qoraalka aasaasiga ah, taas oo ku jeedinaya in qaar madax ka mid ah ay u shaqeeyaan maareynta baaritaanka. Sidoo kale waxaynu u baaraynaa sida loo beddelayo awoodda kormeedka qofka madaxa u dhiga (CGI) in uu beddelo si fiican u qabsado laba nooc oo shaqo ah kadib, kuwaas oo ah hadalka ku saabsan shaqada u eg (SMS) iyo qabashada afka dabiicadda (NLI). Abaalkayaga waxaa loola jeedaa in shaqaalaha SMS ay hoosaysiiyaan awoodda CGI ee heerarka sare, marka shaqada NLI ay kordhiso. ugu dambeyso waxaynu baaraynaa xiriirka u dhexeeya awoodda CGI iyo waxgarashada afka dabiicadda ah ee QQQP iyo MNLI.", 'ur': "اگلے سالوں میں پیش آموزش کی زبان موڈل کے موفقیت کے ساتھ، ان موڈلوں کے 'سیاه باکس' کو کھولنے پر زیادہ اور زیادہ تحقیق کرنے والے تمرکز کرتے ہیں. اس علاقه کے پیچھے ہم BERT اور RoBERTa کے سرداروں میں ایک کیلوٹیٹی اور مقدار تحلیل کریں گے۔ ہم ہر سر کی توجه سے سینٹکتیک دور کی طرح استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ ہمارے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ سر موجود ہیں جو کچھ گراماری طریقوں کو بنیاس لین سے بہت اچھی طرح بنا سکتے ہیں، یہاں تک کہ بعض سر ایسے کریں جن کو مقامات گراماری کے لئے پروکسی بنا سکتے ہیں. ہم نے بھی تحقیق کرلیا کہ آپ کے سرداروں کی محدودیت گراماری (CGI) قابلیت کے بعد دو طرح کاروں کے مطابق تنظیم کرنے کے بعد کس طرح تغییر کرتی ہے۔ ہمارے نتیجے اس بات سے پیش کرتے ہیں کہ SMS تاسکیاں اوپر لہروں کے متوسط CGI قابلیت کم کرتی ہیں اور NLI تاسکیاں اسے زیادہ کرتی ہیں۔ بالآخر، ہم CGI قابلیت اور طبیعی زبان سمجھنے کی قابلیت کے درمیان اتصال کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں QQP اور MNLI کاموں کے بارے میں.", 'sv': 'Med framgångarna med färdigutbildade språkmodeller under de senaste åren fokuserar allt fler forskare på att öppna den "svarta lådan" för dessa modeller. Efter detta intresse genomför vi en kvalitativ och kvantitativ analys av valkretsgrammatiken hos BERT:s och RoBERTa:s uppmärksamhetschefer. Vi använder den syntaktiska distansmetoden för att extrahera implicit valkretsgrammatik från uppmärksamhetsvikten för varje huvud. Våra resultat visar att det finns huvuden som kan framkalla vissa grammatiktyper mycket bättre än baslinjer, vilket tyder på att vissa huvuden fungerar som en proxy för valkretsens grammatik. Vi analyserar också hur uppmärksamhetschefernas valkretsgrammatik inducerande förmåga förändras efter finjustering med två typer av uppgifter, inklusive menings signifikans likhet (SMS) uppgifter och Natural Language inference (NLI) uppgifter. Våra resultat tyder på att SMS-uppgifter minskar den genomsnittliga CGI-förmågan hos övre lager, medan NLI-uppgifter ökar den. Slutligen undersöker vi sambanden mellan CGI förmåga och naturspråkförståelse för QQP och MNLI uppgifter.', 'ta': "சமீபத்தில் பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரிகளின் வெற்றியில், மேலும் மேலும் ஆராய்ச்சிகள் இந்த மாதிரிகளின் 'கருப்பு பெட்டி' தி Following this interest, we carry out a qualitative and quantitative analysis of constituency grammar in attention heads of BERT and RoBERTa.  நாம் ஒவ்வொரு தலைப்பின் கவனத்தின் எடையிலிருந்தும் பொருள் குறிப்பை வெளியேற்றுவதற்கு ஒத்திசைக்கூட்ட தூரத்தி முடிவு நாம் எவ்வாறு கவனம் தலைவர்களின் தலைப்புக்குறிப்பு பிரச்சினையின் தேவையை ஆராய்ந்து கொள்கிறோம். இரண்டு வகையான பணிகளுடன் சரியாக மாற்றும் பிறகு, வாக்கியம் என்பது  எங்கள் முடிவுகள் SMS பணிகள் அதை அதிகரிக்கும் போது சராசரியான CGI அடுக்கு குறைக்கும் தெரியும். கடைசியாக, நாம் CGI தேவைகளுக்கும் இயற்கையான மொழி புரிந்து கொள்ளும் இணைப்புகளுக்கும் இடையே ஆய்வு செய்கிற", 'uz': "With the success of pre-trained language models in recent years, more and more researchers focus on opening the 'black box' of these models.  Bu maslahatdan keyin biz BERT va RoBERTAning boshqaruvchilariga taʼminlovchi va qualitativ analyzerni bajaramiz. Biz har bir boshqa qiymatdan foydalanish uchun qo'shimcha grammatika qo'llanmiz. Bizning natijalarimiz shunday ko'rsatish mumkin, bir necha grammatika turlarini asosiy satrlardan yaxshi ko'proksi yaratishi mumkin. Baʼzi boshqaruvchilar bunday grammatika proksi sifatida bajariladi. Biz boshqaruvchilar qanday taqdimot grammatika (CGI) vazifalar bilan ikki xil vazifalar o'zgarishni o'rganamiz. Bu so'zlar huddi vazifalar (SMS) va tabiiy tillar muammolari (NLI) vazifalari bilan o'zgartiradi. Bizning natijalarimiz SMS vazifalari yuqori qatlamning o'rtacha CGI imkoniyatini kamaytirish mumkin, va NLI vazifalari ularni oshirish mumkin. Oxirgi, biz QQQP va MNLI vazifalari bilan CGI qobiliyatlari va tabiiy tillar imkoniyatini o'rganishni o'rganimiz.", 'vi': 'Với sự thành công của các mô hình ngôn ngữ được đào tạo trong những năm gần đây, ngày càng nhiều nhà nghiên cứu tập trung vào việc mở "hộp đen" của các mô hình này. Theo sự chú ý này, chúng tôi tiến hành một cuộc phân tích về ngôn ngữ bầu cử về các nhà lãnh đạo của BERT và RoBERTa. Chúng tôi dùng phương pháp đường dài cú pháp để tách ngữ pháp bầu cử ngầm khỏi các trọng lượng chú ý của mỗi đầu. Những kết quả của chúng tôi cho thấy có những cái đầu có thể gây ra các loại ngữ pháp nhiều hơn nhiều so với những đường cơ bản, cho thấy một số người đứng đầu là người ủy nhiệm cho ngữ pháp bầu cử. Chúng tôi cũng phân tích cách khả năng bắt đầu tập trung trong cử tri (CGI) thay đổi sau khi kết hợp lại với hai loại công việc, gồm các công việc giống nhau (SMS) và các công việc ngụ ngôn tự nhiên Kết quả của chúng tôi cho thấy các công việc nhắn tin giảm khả năng CGi trung bình của các lớp trên, trong khi công việc NIL tăng nó. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi nghiên cứu các kết nối giữa kỹ năng CGi và khả năng hiểu ngôn ngữ tự nhiên về chất QP và MNLl.', 'da': 'Med succesen med forududdannede sprogmodeller i de seneste år fokuserer flere og flere forskere på at åbne den "sorte boks" af disse modeller. På baggrund af denne interesse foretager vi en kvalitativ og kvantitativ analyse af valgkredsens grammatik hos opmærksomhedsledere fra BERT og RoBERTa. Vi anvender den syntaktiske afstandsmetode til at udtrække implicit valgkreds grammatik fra opmærksomhedsvægtene i hvert hoved. Vores resultater viser, at der findes hoveder, der kan fremkalde nogle grammatiktyper meget bedre end basislinjer, hvilket tyder på, at nogle hoveder fungerer som en proxy for valgkreds grammatik. Vi analyserer også, hvordan opmærksomhedsledernes evne til at fremkalde grammatik (CGI) ændrer sig efter finjustering med to slags opgaver, herunder sætnings betydning lighedsopgaver (SMS) og Natural Language inference (NLI) opgaver. Vores resultater tyder på, at SMS-opgaver reducerer den gennemsnitlige CGI-evne i øvre lag, mens NLI-opgaver øger den. Endelig undersøger vi sammenhængen mellem CGI evne og naturlig sprogforståelse evne på QQP og MNLI opgaver.', 'hr': 'S uspjehom predobučenih jezičkih modela u posljednjih godina, više istraživača usredotočilo se na otvaranje "crne kutije" tih modela. Nakon ovog interesa provodimo kvalitativnu i kvantitativnu analizu gramatike predstavljanja u glavama BERT i RoBERTa. Koristimo sintaktičku metodu udaljenosti da izvučemo implicitnu gramatiku predstavnosti iz težine pažnje svake glave. Naši rezultati pokazuju da postoje glave koje mogu izazvati neke gramatičke vrste mnogo bolje od početnih linija, sugerirajući da neki glave djeluju kao proksi za gramatiku predstavljanja. Također analiziramo kako se gramatička sposobnost pozornosti glavnih predstavnica induciranja (CGI) mijenja nakon ispravne prilagodbe s dvije vrste zadataka, uključujući rečenicu koja znači sličnost (SMS) zadataka i prirodne jezičke infekcije (NLI) zadataka. Naši rezultati sugeriraju da su zadaci SMS-a smanjili prosječnu sposobnost CGI-a gornjeg sloja, dok su zadaci NLI povećali. Na kraju, istražujemo veze između sposobnosti CGI-a i sposobnosti razumijevanja prirodnog jezika o zadatkima QQP-a i MNLI-a.', 'id': 'Dengan sukses dari model bahasa yang sudah dilatih selama bertahun-tahun terakhir, lebih banyak peneliti fokus pada membuka kotak hitam dari model ini. Setelah kepentingan ini, kita melakukan analisis kualitatif dan kuantitatif dari gramatika konstitusi dalam perhatian kepala BERT dan RoBERTa. Kami menggunakan metode jarak sintaksi untuk mengekstrak grammar konstitusi implicit dari berat perhatian setiap kepala. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahwa ada kepala yang dapat mendorong beberapa tipe gramatika jauh lebih baik dari garis dasar, menyarankan bahwa beberapa kepala bertindak sebagai proksi untuk gramatika konstitusi. Kami juga menganalisis bagaimana gramatika konstitusi kepala perhatian menginduksi kemampuan (CGI) berubah setelah memperbaiki dengan dua jenis tugas, termasuk kalimat berarti tugas persamaan (SMS) dan tugas bahasa alami (NLI). Hasil kami menunjukkan bahwa tugas SMS mengurangi kemampuan CGI rata-rata dari lapisan atas, sementara tugas NLI meningkatkannya. Akhirnya, kami menyelidiki koneksi antara kemampuan CGI dan kemampuan pemahaman bahasa alam dalam tugas QQP dan MNLI.', 'bg': 'С успеха на предварително обучените езикови модели през последните години все повече изследователи се фокусират върху отварянето на "черната кутия" на тези модели. Следвайки този интерес, извършваме качествен и количествен анализ на избирателната граматика в ръководителите на вниманието на БРТ и РоБЕРТА. Използваме метода на синтактичното разстояние, за да извлечем имплицитната избирателна граматика от тежестите на вниманието на всяка глава. Нашите резултати показват, че съществуват глави, които могат да индуцират някои видове граматика много по-добре от базовите линии, което предполага, че някои глави действат като прокси за граматиката на избирателните райони. Анализираме също така как способността за индуциране на граматиката на избирателните ръководители на вниманието се променя след фина настройка с два вида задачи, включително задачи за сходство с изречение (СМС) и задачи за извеждане на естествен език (НЛИ). Нашите резултати предполагат, че задачите намаляват средната способност на горните слоеве, докато задачите я увеличават. На последно място, изследваме връзките между способността на КГИ и способността за разбиране на естествения език при задачите на КQP и MNLI.', 'nl': "Met het succes van voorgetrainde taalmodellen in de afgelopen jaren richten steeds meer onderzoekers zich op het openen van de 'black box' van deze modellen. Naar aanleiding van deze interesse voeren we een kwalitatieve en kwantitatieve analyse uit van de kiesdistrictgrammatica bij aandachtsheofden van BERT en RoBERTa. We gebruiken de syntactische afstandsmethode om impliciete kiesdistrictgrammatica uit de aandachtsgewichten van elk hoofd te extraheren. Onze resultaten tonen aan dat er koppen bestaan die sommige grammatica types veel beter kunnen induceren dan baselines, wat suggereert dat sommige koppen fungeren als een proxy voor kiesdistrictgrammatica. We analyseren ook hoe het vermogen van aandachtsheofden om grammatica te induceren (CGI) verandert na het finetunen met twee soorten taken, waaronder SMS-taken (zin betekening similarity) en NLI-taken (Natural Language Inference). Onze resultaten suggereren dat SMS-taken de gemiddelde CGI-capaciteit van hogere lagen verminderen, terwijl NLI-taken deze verhogen. Ten slotte onderzoeken we de verbanden tussen CGI vermogen en natuurlijke taal begrip vermogen op QQP en MNLI taken.", 'fa': 'با موفقیت مدل های پیش آموزش زبانی در سالهای اخیر، بیشتر و بیشتر محققان روی باز کردن جعبه سیاه این مدل تمرکز می کنند. بعد از این علاقه، ما یک تحلیل کیفیت و تعدادی از گرامرات محلی در رئیس توجه BERT و RoBERTa انجام می دهیم. ما روش فاصله\u200cای سنتاکتیک را استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا از وزن توجه هر سر برداشته شود. نتیجه\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که سرهای وجود دارند که می\u200cتوانند برخی نوع گرامبری بهتر از خط\u200cهای پایین\u200cها را پیشنهاد کنند که برخی سرها به عنوان پروکسی برای گرامبری محیط\u200cها عمل می\u200cکنند. ما همچنین تحلیل می\u200cکنیم که چگونه توانایی قابلیت توجه به عنوان برنامه\u200cریزی (CGI) محیطه\u200cهای رئیس توجه را بعد از تنظیم کردن دو نوع کار تغییر می\u200cدهد، شامل جمله جمله جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cای که معنی مشابه (SMS) وظیفه\u200cهای زبان نتیجه\u200cهای ما پیشنهاد می\u200cدهند که کارهای SMS توانایی CGI متوسط طبقه بالا را کاهش می\u200cکند، در حالی که کار NLI آن را افزایش می\u200cدهد. بالاخره، ما ارتباطات بین توانایی CGI و توانایی درک زبان طبیعی در مورد وظیفه های QQP و MNLI تحقیق می کنیم.', 'sw': "Kwa mafanikio ya mifano ya lugha iliyoendelea katika miaka ya hivi karibuni, watafiti zaidi na zaidi wanajikita kufungua 'boksi nyeusi' ya mifano hii. Kufuatia maslahi haya, tunafanya uchambuzi wa kipimo na kiasi cha gramma ya uchaguzi katika vichwa vya BERT na RoBERTA. Tunatumia mbinu za umbali wa usalama ili kuondoa grammati yenye maana kutoka kwenye mizani ya kila kichwa. Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kuwa kuna vichwa ambavyo vinaweza kusababisha baadhi ya aina za grammani bora kuliko misingi ya msingi, wakipendekeza kwamba baadhi ya vichwa vinafanya kazi kama maagizo ya uchaguzi. Kadhalika tunachambua jinsi maarufu ya ubunge wa maoni yanavyozidi kuonyesha uwezo wa CGI (CGI) hubadilika baada ya kupambana na kazi mbili, ikiwa ni pamoja na hukumu inayomaanisha kazi sawa (SMS) na maambukizi ya lugha asili (NLI). Our results suggest that SMS tasks decrease the average CGI ability of upper layers, while NLI tasks increase it.  Mwisho, tunachunguza uhusiano kati ya uwezo wa CGI na uwezo wa kuelewa lugha asili juu ya kazi za QQQP na MNLI.", 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 예훈련 언어 모델의 성공에 따라 점점 더 많은 연구자들이 이러한 모델의 블랙박스를 여는 것에 관심을 가지기 시작했다.이러한 흥미를 바탕으로 우리는 에서 선택한 문법에 대해 정성과 정량 분석을 실시했다.우리는 문법 거리 방법을 사용하여 모든 머리의 주의권에서 은식 선택 문법을 추출한다.우리의 연구 결과에 의하면 일부 머리는 기선보다 일부 문법 유형을 더 잘 귀납하는데 이것은 일부 머리는 선택 영역 문법의 대리임을 나타낸다.두 가지 임무(문장의 의미 유사성(SMS) 임무와 자연언어추리(NLI) 임무 포함)를 미세하게 조정한 뒤 주의 헤드의 선택구 문법유도(CGI) 능력이 어떻게 변화하는지도 분석했다.우리의 연구 결과에 따르면 SMS 임무는 상부의 평균 CGI 능력을 낮추고 NLI 임무는 그것을 향상시켰다.마지막으로 QQP와 MNLI 임무 중 CGI 능력과 자연 언어 이해 능력 간의 관계를 연구했다.', 'de': 'Mit dem Erfolg vortrainierter Sprachmodelle in den letzten Jahren konzentrieren sich immer mehr Forscher darauf, die "Black Box" dieser Modelle zu öffnen. Im Anschluss an dieses Interesse führen wir eine qualitative und quantitative Analyse der Wahlkreisgrammatik in Aufmerksamkeitsleitern von BERT und RoBERTa durch. Wir verwenden die syntaktische Distanzmethode, um implizite Wahlkreisgrammatik aus den Aufmerksamkeitsgewichten jedes Kopfes zu extrahieren. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass es Heads gibt, die einige Grammatiktypen viel besser induzieren können als Baselines, was darauf hindeutet, dass einige Heads als Stellvertreter für die Wahlkreisgrammatik fungieren. Wir analysieren auch, wie sich die CGI-Fähigkeit der Aufmerksamkeitsgramik-induzierenden Köpfe nach der Feinabstimmung mit zwei Arten von Aufgaben ändert, einschließlich Satz-Bedeutungsähnlichkeitsaufgaben (SMS) und Natural Language Inference (NLI). Unsere Ergebnisse deuten darauf hin, dass SMS-Tasks die durchschnittliche CGI-Fähigkeit von oberen Ebenen verringern, während NLI-Tasks sie erhöhen. Schließlich untersuchen wir die Zusammenhänge zwischen CGI-Fähigkeit und natürlicher Sprachverständnisfähigkeit bei QQP- und MNLI-Aufgaben.', 'tr': "Soňky ýyllarda öňünden öňünden bilim sistemasy nusgalarynyň üstüne getirilip bilen bu nusgalaryň 'gara gutyny' açmakda köp pikir edýärler. Bu gyzyklandygyň soňra BERT we RoBERTa başlygyny üns berýän constituency gramatiýasynyň keyfiýeti we kvantityýaly çözümlerini çykarýarys. Biz her kelläň näsazlyklaryndan daşary çekmek üçin sintaktik uzak yöntemi ulanýarys. Biziň netijelerimiz gramatik hilleriň baz hatlaryndan gowy bir şekilde etmäge mümkin edýändigini görkezýär. Käbir kellämiz baýramçylyk gramatik üçin proksi hökmünde edip bilýärler. Biz hem kellelerin constituency gramatika nähili üns berip bilmegi üçin (CGI) başaryşlaryň 2 çeşit işi bilen düzeltdikden soňra üns berilýäris, sözleriň meňzeşliki (SMS) zadlaryny we tebigy dil aşaryşlaryň (NLI) zadyny diýip soramagyny çözýäris. Bizim netijelerimiz SMS görevlerinin ortalama CGI üst katlar kapasitesini azaltmaklarını öneririyor, NLI görevleri arttır. Soňunda, biz CGI başaryşlaryň we tebigy dilleriniň QQP we MNLI zadlarynyň baglaýyşlaryny barlaýarys.", 'am': "የቀድሞው ዓመታት የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች ስኬት በተደረገ ጊዜ፣ ብዙ አስተማሪዎችም የዚህን ዓይነቶች “ጥቁር box” በመክፈት ላይ ይዘጋጅተዋል፡፡ ከዚህም ውስጥነት በኋላ የBERT እና ሮብERTA አለቆች የባሕላዊ እና የመንግሥት ትምህርት አካባቢ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከሁሉም የራስ ሚዛን ለመውጣት የግንኙነቱን ድምፅ ለማውጣት እናስቀራለን፡፡ ፍጥረታችን አንዳንዶቹ አካባቢዎች ለፓርቲው ፕሮክሲ እንዲያሳየቁ የሚችሉ አለቆች አሉ፡፡ We also analyze how attention heads' constituency grammar inducing (CGI) ability changes after fine-tuning with two kinds of tasks, including sentence meaning similarity (SMS) tasks and natural language inference (NLI) tasks.  ፍሬዎቻችን የSMS ስራዎችን በላይ ደረጃዎች የCGI ኃይል የሚያጎድልበትን እና NLI ስራዎችን ሲጨምር ያሳያል፡፡ በመጨረሻውም በQQP እና MNLI ስርዓቶች ላይ የCGI ኃይል እና የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማስተዋል መካከል ግንኙነትን እናመርምር፡፡", 'hy': 'Վերջին տարիների ընթացքում նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելների հաջողությամբ ավելի շատ հետազոտողներ կենտրոնանում են այս մոդելների սև արկղի բացելուն: Following this interest, we carry out a qualitative and quantitative analysis of constituency grammar in attention heads of BERT and RoBERTa.  Մենք օգտագործում ենք սինտակտիկ հեռավորության մեթոդը, որպեսզի ստանանք յուրաքանչյուր գլխավորի ուշադրության կշիռներից ներկա ընտրական գրամագրությունը: Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ գլխավորները գոյություն ունեն, որոնք կարող են առաջացնել որոշ գրամական տեսակներ ավելի լավ, քան հիմնական գծերը, առաջարկում են, որ որոշ գլխավորները գործում են որպես ընտրական շրջանի գրամական արտահայտություն Մենք նաև վերլուծում ենք, թե ինչպես է ուշադրության գլխավորների ընտրական շրջանի գրամագրությունը (CGI) կարողությունը փոխվում երկու տեսակի առաջադրանքներով, ներառյալ նախադասությունը, որը նշանակում է նմանություն (SMS) առաջադրանքները և բնական լեզվի հետևանքները (NԼI) առաջա Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ SMS-ի առաջադրանքները նվազեցնում են վերևի շերտերի CGI միջին կարողությունը, մինչդեռ ՆԼԱ-ի առաջադրանքները աճում են այն: Վերջապես, մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք ԿԳԻ ունակության և բնական լեզվի հասկանալու ունակության կապերը QQP-ի և MNSI-ի առաջադրանքների վրա:', 'az': "Son illərdə öyrənmiş dil modellərinin başarısıyla, daha çox araştırmacılar bu modellərin 'siyah qutusu' açmağa odaqlanır. Bu səhifələrin ardınca, BERT və RoBERTa başçılarına dikkat etdiyimiz səhifələr gramatiyasının kvalitativ və kvantitatlı analizi çəkirik. Biz sintaktik uzaq yöntemini hər başının dikkati ağırlığından imkansız constituency gramatiyasını çıxartmaq üçün istifadə edirik. Sonuçlarımız göstərir ki, bazı kafalar, bazı səhifələrimizdən daha yaxşı olaraq, bəzi kafalar səhifələr gramatik üçün proksi olaraq davranır. Biz həmçinin dikkati başlıqlarının gramatik inşallarını (CGI) qabiliyyəti, iki cür işlər düzəltdikdən sonra, cümlələrə bənzər işlər və təbiətli dil inşallarını (NLI) danışmaq anlamına gəldikdən sonra necə dəyişəcəyini analiz edirik. NLI işləri artırmaq üçün SMS işlərimizin ortalama CGI yüksək səviyyələrinin qabiliyyətini azaltmasını təmin edir. Sonunda, QQP və MNLI işləri barəsində CGI qabiliyyəti və təbiətli dil anlama qabiliyyəti arasındakı bağlantıları incidirik.", 'bs': "Sa uspjehom predobučenih jezičkih modela u poslednjih godina, više istraživača se fokusiraju na otvaranje 'crne kutije' ovih modela. Nakon ovog interesa, provodimo kvalitativnu i kvantitativnu analizu gramatike predstavljanja u pozornim glavama BERT i RoBERTa. Koristimo sintaktičku metodu udaljenosti da izvučemo implicitnu gramatiku predstavnosti iz težine pažnje svake glave. Naši rezultati pokazuju da postoje glave koje mogu inducirati neke gramatičke vrste mnogo bolje od početnih linija, sugerirajući da neki glave djeluju kao proksi za gramatiku predstavljanja. Također analiziramo kako se gramatika predstavljanja pozornosti glave (CGI) mijenja sposobnost nakon ispravne prilagodbe sa dvije vrste zadataka, uključujući rečenicu koja znači sličnost (SMS) zadataka i prirodne jezičke infekcije (NLI) zadataka. Naši rezultati ukazuju na to da su zadaci SMS-a smanjili prosječnu sposobnost CGI-a gornjih slojeva, dok su zadaci NLI povećali. Na kraju, istražujemo veze između sposobnosti CGI-a i sposobnosti razumijevanja prirodnog jezika o zadacima QQP-a i MNLI-a.", 'af': "Met die sukses van voor-opgelei taal modele in onlangse jaar, meer en meer resekers fokus op die oopmaak van die 'swart boks' van hierdie modele. Volgens hierdie belang, ons uitvoer 'n kwaliteit en kvantitatiewe analisie van konstituency grammar in aandagkoppe van BERT en RoBERTa. Ons gebruik die sintaktieke afstand metode om inplisite konstituasie grammatiek uit die aanmerksgewighede van elke kop te uittrek. Ons resultate wys dat daar bestaan koppe wat sommige grammatiese tipes baie beter kan induseer as basisline, wat voorstel dat sommige koppe as 'n volmag vir konstituency grammatiek werk. Ons analiseer ook hoe aanmerking hoof se konstituency grammatiek wat (CGI) moontlikheid verander na fyn-tuning met twee soorte taak, insluitend setinge beteken gelykenis (SMS) taak en natuurlike taal inferensie (NLI) taak. Ons resultate stel voorstel dat SMS-opdragte die gemiddelde CGI-kapasiteit van boonste laagte verklein, terwyl NLI-opdragte dit vergroot. Las, ons ondersoek die verbindings tussen CGI-kapasiteit en natuurlike taal verstaande kapasiteit op QQP en MNLI-opdragte.", 'sq': "Me suksesin e modeleve të gjuhës paratrajnuar në vitet e fundit, gjithnjë e më shumë kërkues përqëndrohen në hapjen e 'kutisë së zezë' të këtyre modeleve. Pas kësaj interesi, ne kryejmë një analizë kualitative dhe kuantitative të gramatikës së qarkut zgjedhor në krerët e vëmendjes të BERT dhe RoBERTa. Ne përdorim metodën sintaktike të distancës për të nxjerrë grammarinë implicite të qarkut zgjedhor nga peshat e vëmendjes së çdo koke. Rezultatet tona tregojnë se ekzistojnë koka që mund të induktojnë disa tipe gramatike shumë më mirë se linjat bazë, duke sugjeruar se disa koka veprojnë si një proxy për gramatikën e qarkut zgjedhor. Ne analizojmë gjithashtu se si funksionet e krahinës zgjedhore të vëmendjes që induktojnë aftësinë (CGI) ndryshojnë pas rregullimit me dy lloje detyrash, duke përfshirë detyrat e fjalëve që kuptojnë ngjashmëri (SMS) dhe përfundimet natyrore të gjuhës (NLI). Rezultatet tona sugjerojnë se detyrat e SMS zvogëlojnë aftësinë mesatare të CGI të niveleve të larta, ndërsa detyrat e NLI e rritin atë. Më në fund, ne hetojmë lidhjet midis aftësisë së CGI dhe aftësisë natyrore të kuptimit të gjuhës në detyrat QQP dhe MNLI.", 'bn': "সাম্প্রতিক বছরগুলোতে পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেলের সফলতার সাথে আরো বেশী গবেষক এই মডেলের 'কালো বাক্স' খোলার দিকে মন এই স্বার্থের পরে আমরা বিবের্ট এবং রোবের্তার প্রধানদের মনোযোগ প্রদান করে রাষ্ট্রপতি গ্রামের বিশ্লেষণের পরিমাণ এবং পরিমাণ বিশ্ল আমরা প্রত্যেক মাথার দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি থেকে প্রতিটি প্রতিটি প্রতিষ্ঠানের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি বের করার জন্য সিন্ট্যাকটিক দূরত্ আমাদের ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে কিছু গ্রামার ধরনের বেসেলাইনের চেয়ে ভালো কিছু ব্যবহার করতে পারে, যার পরামর্শ দেয়া হচ্ছে যে কিছু মাথার কিছু প এছাড়াও আমরা বিশ্লেষণ করি কিভাবে মনোযোগ আকর্ষণের প্রধান গ্রাম উৎপাদন (সিজিজি) ক্ষমতা পরিবর্তন করে দুই ধরনের কাজের সাথে সুন্দর করার পর, যার মধ্যে বাক্যের মানে একই রকম ( আমাদের ফলাফল পরামর্শ দিয়েছে যে এসএমএস কাজের সাধারণ সিজিজি উপরের ক্ষমতা কমিয়ে দিয়েছে, যখন এনলির কাজ বাড়ছে। শেষে, আমরা সিজিজির ক্ষমতা এবং প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা বুঝতে পারি কিউকিপি এবং এমএনলির কাজের উপর সংযোগের মধ্যে তদন্ত করি।", 'et': 'Eelkoolitud keelemudelite edu tõttu viimastel aastatel keskendub üha enam teadlasi nende mudelite musta kasti avamisele. Selle huvi põhjal teostame BERT ja RoBERTa tähelepanujuhtides valimisringkondade grammatika kvalitatiivse ja kvantitatiivse analüüsi. Me kasutame süntaktilist distantsi meetodit, et eraldada kaudset valimisringkonna grammatikat iga pea tähelepanukaaludest. Meie tulemused näitavad, et on olemas pead, mis võivad indutseerida mõningaid grammatikatüüpe palju paremini kui algjooned, mis viitavad sellele, et mõned pead toimivad valimisringkonna grammatika proxy. Samuti analüüsime, kuidas tähelepanu tekitava graafika (CGI) võime muutub pärast peenhäälestust kahte liiki ülesannetega, sealhulgas lause tähenduse sarnasuse (SMS) ülesannetega ja looduskeele järelduse (NLI) ülesannetega. Meie tulemused näitavad, et SMS-ülesanded vähendavad ülemiste kihtide keskmist CGI-võimet ja NLI-ülesanded suurendavad seda. Lõpuks uurime seoseid CGI võime ja looduskeele mõistmise võime vahel QQP ja MNLI ülesannetel.', 'fi': 'Viime vuosina esikoulutettujen kielimallien menestyksen myötä yhä useammat tutkijat keskittyvät avaamaan mallien mustaa laatikkoa. Tämän kiinnostuksen perusteella teemme kvalitatiivisen ja kvantitatiivisen analyysin vaalipiirin kieliopistosta BERT:n ja RoBERTa:n huomiopäälliköissä. Käytämme syntaktista etäisyysmenetelmää poimimaan implisiittisen vaalipiirin kieliopin jokaisen pään huomiopainoista. Tuloksemme osoittavat, että on olemassa päitä, jotka voivat indusoida joitakin kielioppityyppejä paljon paremmin kuin perusviivat, mikä viittaa siihen, että jotkut päät toimivat vaalipiirin kieliopin proxyina. Analysoimme myös, miten huomiopäiden vaalipiirin kieliopin indusoiva kyky (CGI) muuttuu hienosäädön jälkeen kahdentyyppisillä tehtävillä, kuten lauseen merkityksen samankaltaisuus (SMS) ja luonnollisen kielen päättelytehtävät (NLI). Tuloksemme viittaavat siihen, että tekstiviestitehtävät vähentävät ylempien kerrosten keskimääräistä CGI-kykyä, kun taas NLI-tehtävät lisäävät sitä. Lopuksi tutkimme CGI-kyvyn ja luonnollisen kielen ymmärtämisen välisiä yhteyksiä QQP- ja MNLI-tehtävissä.', 'ca': "Amb l'èxit dels models de llenguatge pré-entrenats en els últims anys, cada cop més investigadors s'centren en obrir la caixa negra d'aquests models. Segons aquest interès, fem una anàlisi qualitativa i quantitativa de la gramàtica electoral en els cap d'atenció de BERT i RoBERTa. Utilitzem el mètode de distància sinàctica per extrair la gramàtica implícita del circuit electoral dels pes d'atenció de cada cap. Els nostres resultats demostren que hi ha cabells que poden induir alguns tipus de gramàtica molt millor que les línies de base, suggerint que alguns cabells actuen com a representant de la gramàtica del districte electoral. We also analyze how attention heads' constituency grammar inducing (CGI) ability changes after fine-tuning with two kinds of tasks, including sentence meaning similarity (SMS) tasks and natural language inference (NLI) tasks.  Els nostres resultats suggereixen que les tasques de SMS redueixen la capacitat mitjana de CGI de les capes superiors, mentre que les tasques de NLI l'augmenten. Finalment, investigam les connexions entre l'habilitat del CGI i l'habilitat de comprensió natural del llenguatge en les tasques QQP i MNLI.", 'cs': 'S úspěchem předškolených jazykových modelů v posledních letech se stále více výzkumníků zaměřuje na otevření "černé skříňky" těchto modelů. Na základě tohoto zájmu provádíme kvalitativní a kvantitativní analýzu volební gramatiky u vedoucích pozornosti BERT a RoBERTa. Používáme metodu syntaktické vzdálenosti k extrakci implicitní volební gramatiky z vah pozornosti každé hlavy. Naše výsledky ukazují, že existují hlavy, které mohou indukovat některé gramatické typy mnohem lépe než základní linie, což naznačuje, že některé hlavy fungují jako zástupce pro gramatiku volebního okresu. Dále analyzujeme, jak se mění schopnost vyvolávající gramatiku (CGI) hlav pozornosti po jemném ladění se dvěma druhy úkolů, včetně úkolů významu podobnosti vět (SMS) a úkolů inference přirozeného jazyka (NLI). Naše výsledky naznačují, že úlohy SMS snižují průměrnou schopnost CGI horních vrstev, zatímco úlohy NLI ji zvyšují. Nakonec zkoumáme souvislosti mezi CGI schopností a schopností porozumět přirozenému jazyku na QQP a MNLI úlohách.', 'sk': 'Zaradi uspeha predhodno usposobljenih jezikovnih modelov v zadnjih letih se vedno več raziskovalcev osredotoča na odpiranje "črne škatle" teh modelov. V skladu s tem interesom izvajamo kvalitativno in kvantitativno analizo slovnice volilnih okrožij pri vodjih pozornosti BERT in RoBERTa. Uporabljamo metodo sintaktične razdalje, da izvlečemo implicitno slovnico volilnega okrožja iz uteži pozornosti vsake glave. Naši rezultati kažejo, da obstajajo glave, ki lahko inducirajo nekatere vrste slovnice veliko bolje kot osnovne črte, kar kaže, da nekatere glave delujejo kot približek slovnice volilnih okrožij. Analiziramo tudi, kako se spreminja sposobnost induciranja slovnice (CGI) volilnih vodij pozornosti po finem uravnavanju z dvema vrstama nalog, vključno z nalogami podobnosti stavkov (SMS) in nalogami sklepanja naravnega jezika (NLI). Naši rezultati kažejo, da opravila SMS zmanjšujejo povprečno CGI sposobnost zgornjih plasti, opravila NLI pa jo povečujejo. Na koncu smo raziskali povezave med sposobnostjo CGI in sposobnostjo razumevanja naravnega jezika pri opravilih QQP in MNLI.', 'ha': "With the success of pre-trained language models in recent years, more and more researchers focus on opening the 'black box' of these models.  Bayan wannan riba, za'a sami wani analai mai ƙayyade da gwargwadon sarki na BERT da RoBERTA. Munã aiki na hanyon tafiyar hanya ta yi syntactic dõmin mu fitar grammati wanda ke cikin matsayi daga nauyi na kõwane kicki. MatamayinMu na nũna cewa there akwai wasu hodes waɗanda ke iya ƙara wasu nau'i na grammati mafi alhẽri daga bakin ayuka, kuma yana shawarar da wasu hoder su yi aiki kamar proksi wa grammati. Ana yin anayyar da jinsi muhalli na makarantar grammar da za'a nuna (CGI) abincin a bayan gyarawa da aiki biyu, kamar maganar ta zama daidai da aikin (SSM) da aikin na asili (NLI). MatamayinMu na gaya cewa aikin SSM za'a ƙara girmar CGI na samar, kuma idan aikin NLI za'a ƙara shi. Lallai, Munã jãyayya linki da ma'abũcin CGI da ma'abũcin hankalin harshen asili a kan QQQP da MNLI.", 'he': 'עם הצלחה של דוגמני שפה מאומנים מראש בשנים האחרונות, יותר ויותר חוקרים מתמקדים בפתיחה של "קופסת שחורה" של דוגמנים אלה. לאחר האינטרס הזה, אנו מבצעים ניתוח איכותי וכוונטיבי של גרמטיקה במחוז הבחירות בראשי תשומת לב של BERT ורוברטה. אנו משתמשים בשיטת המרחק הסינטקטי כדי להוציא גרמטיקה של מחוז הבחירות מפני משקלי תשומת לב של כל ראש. התוצאות שלנו מראות שיש ראשים שיכולים לגרום לכמה סוגי גרמטיקה הרבה יותר טובים מהשורות הבסיסיות, מציעים שכמה ראשים מתנהגים כמפקד לגרמטיקה במחוז הבחירות. אנו גם מנתחים כיצד התשובה של ראשי המחוז הבחירי (CGI) משתנה את היכולת לאחר התאים עם שני סוגים של משימות, כולל משפט שמשמע דומה (SMS) משימות ותוצאות שפה טבעית (NLI). התוצאות שלנו מציעות שמשימות SMS מפחידות את יכולת CGI הממוצעת של שכבות גבוהות, בזמן שמשימות NLI מגבילות אותה. בסופו של דבר, אנחנו חוקרים את הקשר בין יכולת CGI ליכולת להבין שפה טבעית על משימות QQP ו MNLI.', 'jv': "Gandhilah dolanan model sing luwih-luwih dumadhi, akeh lan banjur-luwih dumadhi kanggo ngilangno 'box' sing model iki. Ngawe wis nggalakno iki, dino nyong nggawe kalitas karo kantihan karo hal-hal dadi nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe BERT karo RBERT. Genjer Rejalaké awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing gak bakal terus-ingkang éntuk sing luwih apik sing luwih basa, supoyo iso nggawe Ketok Bapak dhéwé ngerasah Proksi kanggo Ketok Bapak. Anyone Reject Lha soalé, ké nyonggunakake perusahaan karo kapan CGI lan luwih pawaran kanggo langgar sapa-sapa batasan kanggo nggunakake NNLI.", 'bo': "With the success of pre-trained language models in recent years, more and more researchers focus on opening the 'black box' of these models. ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཚུལ་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྗེས་སུ་BERT དང RoBERTa པར་དབྱིབས་གྱི་རྩིས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་དང་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་བ ང་ཚོས་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་ཐག་རིང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཕྱིར་ཚོང་བའི་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་བྱ་རིམ་སྟོན་ཐུབ་པ། ང་ཚོའི་འབྲུག་འབྲས་བུའི་རྐྱེན་སྟངས་འདི་ཡོད་པའི་མགོ་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་སྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྡན་དང་། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་དབང་ཆ་གཙོ་རིམ་གཙོ་རིམ་གྱི་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་ཚེས་SMS ལས་ཀ་ལྟ་ཀློག་པས་་རྒྱ་ཆེ་བའི་བགོ་རིམ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཏུ་གཏོང་། མཐའ་མར། ང་ཚོས་CGI ལུས་ཆེན་དང་རང་རུང་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་དབང་ཡོད་པའི་མཐུད་ལམ་ལ་བརྟན་ཞིབ་བྱེད་དགོས་པ།"}
{'en': 'Do we read what we hear? Modeling orthographic influences on spoken word recognition', 'ar': 'هل نقرأ ما نسمعه؟ تأثيرات النمذجة الإملائية على التعرف على الكلمات المنطوقة', 'es': '¿Leemos lo que oímos? Modelar las influencias ortográficas en el reconocimiento de palabras', 'fr': 'Est-ce que nous lisons ce que nous entendons\xa0? Modélisation des influences orthographiques sur la reconnaissance de la parole', 'pt': 'Lemos o que ouvimos? Modelagem de influências ortográficas no reconhecimento de palavras faladas', 'ja': '聞こえたものを読むのか？口語認識へのモデリングと正書法の影響', 'zh': '我们读了我们所闻的? 拟正字法对口语单词识', 'hi': 'क्या हम पढ़ते हैं कि हम क्या सुनते हैं? मॉडलिंग बोले गए शब्द मान्यता पर ऑर्थोग्राफिक प्रभाव', 'ru': 'Мы читаем то, что слышим? Моделирование орфографических влияний на распознавание устных слов', 'ga': 'An léann muid an méid a chloisimid? Tionchair ortagrafacha ar aithint focal labhartha a shamhaltú', 'ka': 'ფვრთმ ლთ კაკგჲ ფსგამვ? მოდელირება ორტოგრაფიკური შემთხვევაში სიტყვების უცნობა', 'hu': 'Olvasjuk, amit hallunk? Ortográfiai hatások modellezése a beszélt szó felismerésére', 'el': 'Διαβάζουμε αυτό που ακούμε; Μοντελοποίηση ορθογραφικών επιρροών στην αναγνώριση προφορικής λέξης', 'kk': 'Ендіргенімізді оқу ма? Сөзді анықтау үшін ортографикалық нәрселер үлгілеу', 'lt': 'Ar skaitome tai, ką girdime? Ortografinio poveikio žodžių pripažinimui modeliavimas', 'it': 'Leggiamo quello che sentiamo? Modellare le influenze ortografiche sul riconoscimento delle parole parlate', 'mk': 'Do we read what we hear?  Моделирање на ортографските влијанија на препознавањето на зборовите', 'ms': 'Adakah kita membaca apa yang kita dengar? Memodel pengaruh ortografik pada pengenalan perkataan bercakap', 'ml': 'ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കേള്\u200dക്കുന്നത് വായിക്കാമോ? സംസാരിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്ക് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിന് മോഡോളിങ് ഓര്\u200dടോഗ്രാഫിക് പ്രഭാവം', 'mt': 'Aqraw dak li jinstemgħu? L-immudellar tal-influwenzi ortografiċi fuq ir-rikonoxximent tal-kelma mitkellma', 'mn': 'Бид юу сонсож байгааг уншиж байна уу? Хүсэглэгдсэн үг танихын тулд ортографик нөлөөг загварчлах', 'no': 'Leser vi hva vi hører? Modeller ortografiske påvirkningar på talet orderkjenning', 'pl': 'Czytamy to, co słyszymy? Modelowanie wpływów ortograficznych na rozpoznawanie słowa mówionego', 'ro': 'Citim ce auzim? Modelarea influențelor ortografice asupra recunoașterii cuvintelor vorbite', 'sr': 'Da li čitamo ono što čujemo? Modeliranje ortografskih utjecaja na prepoznavanje reèi', 'so': 'Ma akhriyaa waxaynu maqalnaa? saameyn ku yeelashada ortografiga ah oo ku saabsan aqoonsiga hadalka', 'sv': 'Läser vi det vi hör? Modellering av ortografiska influenser på igenkänning av talat ord', 'ta': 'நாம் கேட்கும் என்ன படிக்க வேண்டுமா? பேச்சு வார்த்தை அடையாளத்தில் மாதிரியும் பாதிப்புகள்', 'si': 'අපි ඇහුන දේ කියනවද? කතා කරපු වචන අඳුරගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න', 'ur': 'کیا ہم اسے پڑھتے ہیں جو ہم سنتے ہیں؟ بات کی پہچان پر اورٹوگرافیک اثرات کی مدل کرتی ہے', 'uz': 'Biz nima eshitanmizmi? Name', 'vi': 'Chúng ta có đọc những gì chúng ta nghe không? Diễn tiến của nét dẫn về nhận dạng từ.', 'bg': 'Четем ли това, което чуваме? Моделиране на ортографските влияния върху разпознаването на говорени думи', 'da': 'Læser vi, hvad vi hører? Modellering af ortografiske påvirkninger af genkendelse af talt ord', 'nl': 'Lezen we wat we horen? Modelleren van orthografische invloeden op gesproken woordherkenning', 'hr': 'Da li čitamo ono što čujemo? Modeliranje ortografskih utjecaja na prepoznavanje riječi', 'de': 'Lesen wir, was wir hören? Modellierung orthographischer Einflüsse auf die Spracherkennung', 'id': 'Apakah kita membaca apa yang kita dengar? Modeling pengaruh ortografik pada pengenalan kata berbicara', 'ko': '저희가 들은 거 읽을까요?정자법이 구어어 식별에 미치는 영향의 모델링', 'sw': 'Je tunasoma tunachosikia? Madhara ya kiorthografia kuhusu kutambua maneno yanayozungumzwa', 'tr': 'Biz e힊id첵채n zadymyzy oka첵armyzmy? G체rle첵채n s철zleri tanamak 체챌in ortografi흫 t채sirini nusgala', 'sq': 'A lexojmë atë që dëgjojmë? Modelimi i ndikimit ortografik në njohjen e fjalëve të folura', 'am': 'የምንሰማውን አንብብ? በ ቃላት ማስታወቂያ ላይ በሞዴል የኦሮግራፊ ውጤት', 'af': 'Lees ons wat ons hoor? Modelering orthografiese influense op gepraat woord herkening', 'az': 'EŇüitdiyimiz Ňüeyl…ôri oxuyuruq? S√∂z tanńĪmasńĪnda ortografik t…ôsirl…ôrini modelleŇüdirm…ôk', 'hy': 'Արդյո՞ք մենք կարդում ենք այն, ինչ լսում ենք: Օրտոգրաֆիկ ազդեցությունների մոդելավորումը խոսված բառերի ճանաչման վրա', 'ca': 'Llegem el que sentim? Modelar influències ortogràfiques en el reconeixement de paraules parlades', 'bn': 'আমরা কি শুনতে পাচ্ছি? কথোপকথন শব্দ স্বীকৃতির উপর মডেলিং অর্থোগ্রাফিক প্রভাব', 'fa': 'چيزي که شنيديم رو مي خونيم؟ مدل تأثیرات orthographic روی شناسایی کلمات صحبت می\u200cکند', 'cs': 'Čteme, co slyšíme? Modelování ortografických vlivů na rozpoznávání mluveného slova', 'fi': 'Luemmeko kuulemamme? Ortografisten vaikutusten mallintaminen puhuttujen sanojen tunnistukseen', 'et': 'Kas loeme seda, mida kuuleme? Ortograafiliste mõjude modelleerimine räägitud sõnatuvastusele', 'bs': 'Da li čitamo ono što čujemo? Modeliranje ortografskih utjecaja na prepoznavanje riječi', 'jv': 'Opo awake dhewe mikirke opo ? politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'sk': 'Ali beremo, kar slišimo? Modeliranje ortografskih vplivov na prepoznavanje govorjenih besed', 'ha': 'Shin zã mu karanta abin da muke ji? Modeling orthographic influences on spoken word recognition', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཁོང་ཚོས་ཀློག་པ་ག་རེ་ཡིན་ནམ། སྐད་ཡིག་གིས་ངོས་འཛིན་པའི་སྣང་ཚུལ་དབྱིབས་འགྱུར་བ་དང་གནོད་པ', 'he': 'Do we read what we hear?  מודל השפעות אורטוגרפיות על זיהוי מילים מדברות'}
{'en': 'Theories and models of spoken word recognition aim to explain the process of accessing lexical knowledge given an acoustic realization of a word form. There is consensus that phonological and semantic information is crucial for this process. However, there is accumulating evidence that orthographic information could also have an impact on auditory word recognition. This paper presents two models of spoken word recognition that instantiate different hypotheses regarding the influence of orthography on this process. We show that these models reproduce human-like behavior in different ways and provide testable hypotheses for future research on the source of orthographic effects in spoken word recognition.', 'fr': "Les théories et les modèles de reconnaissance orale visent à expliquer le processus d'accès à la connaissance lexicale à partir d'une réalisation acoustique d'une forme de mot. Il existe un consensus sur le fait que l'information phonologique et sémantique est cruciale pour ce processus. Cependant, de plus en plus de preuves indiquent que les informations orthographiques peuvent également avoir un impact sur la reconnaissance auditive des mots. Cet article présente deux modèles de reconnaissance de mots oraux qui instancient différentes hypothèses concernant l'influence de l'orthographe sur ce processus. Nous montrons que ces modèles reproduisent le comportement humain de différentes manières et fournissent des hypothèses vérifiables pour de futures recherches sur la source des effets orthographiques dans la reconnaissance des mots oraux.", 'es': 'Las teorías y modelos de reconocimiento de palabras habladas tienen como objetivo explicar el proceso de acceso al conocimiento léxico dada una realización acústica de una forma de palabra. Hay consenso en que la información fonológica y semántica es crucial para este proceso. Sin embargo, hay pruebas acumuladas de que la información ortográfica también podría tener un impacto en el reconocimiento auditivo de palabras. Este artículo presenta dos modelos de reconocimiento de palabras habladas que ejemplifican diferentes hipótesis sobre la influencia de la ortografía en este proceso. Mostramos que estos modelos reproducen el comportamiento similar al humano de diferentes maneras y proporcionan hipótesis comprobables para futuras investigaciones sobre la fuente de los efectos ortográficos en el reconocimiento de palabras habladas.', 'ar': 'تهدف نظريات ونماذج التعرف على الكلمات المنطوقة إلى شرح عملية الوصول إلى المعرفة المعجمية في ضوء الإدراك الصوتي لشكل الكلمة. هناك إجماع على أن المعلومات الصوتية والدلالية ضرورية لهذه العملية. ومع ذلك ، هناك أدلة متراكمة على أن المعلومات الإملائية يمكن أن يكون لها أيضًا تأثير على التعرف على الكلمات السمعية. يقدم هذا البحث نموذجين للتعرف على الكلمات المنطوقة واللذان يولدان فرضيات مختلفة فيما يتعلق بتأثير قواعد الإملاء على هذه العملية. نظهر أن هذه النماذج تعيد إنتاج سلوك شبيه بالبشر بطرق مختلفة وتوفر فرضيات قابلة للاختبار للبحث المستقبلي حول مصدر التأثيرات الإملائية في التعرف على الكلمات المنطوقة.', 'pt': 'Teorias e modelos de reconhecimento de palavras faladas visam explicar o processo de acesso ao conhecimento lexical a partir de uma realização acústica de uma forma de palavra. É consenso que a informação fonológica e semântica é crucial para esse processo. No entanto, há evidências acumuladas de que a informação ortográfica também pode ter um impacto no reconhecimento auditivo de palavras. Este artigo apresenta dois modelos de reconhecimento de palavras faladas que instanciam diferentes hipóteses sobre a influência da ortografia nesse processo. Mostramos que esses modelos reproduzem o comportamento humano de diferentes maneiras e fornecem hipóteses testáveis para pesquisas futuras sobre a origem dos efeitos ortográficos no reconhecimento de palavras faladas.', 'ja': '話し言葉認識の理論とモデルは、単語形態の音響的実現を与えられた語彙知識にアクセスするプロセスを説明することを目的としている。音声学的および意味論的情報は、このプロセスに不可欠であるというコンセンサスがあります。しかし、正書法の情報が聴覚の単語認識にも影響を及ぼす可能性があるという証拠が蓄積されている。本稿では，この過程における正書法の影響に関する異なる仮説を例示する2つの口語認識モデルを提示する．これらのモデルは、人間のような行動を異なる方法で再現し、口語認識におけるオルソグラフィー効果のソースに関する将来の研究のためのテスト可能な仮説を提供することを示しています。', 'zh': '口语识理,模形说给定单词声学,取词汇知识。 人皆以为语音语义信息至重。 然益多证明,正字法信息,亦或单词闻。 本文设二语单词别模形,其实例化正字法异端假设。 吾示以异道见类人之行,而为未来口语识中正字法效之原,可试之设也。', 'hi': 'बोले गए शब्द मान्यता के सिद्धांतों और मॉडलों का उद्देश्य एक शब्द रूप की ध्वनिक प्राप्ति को देखते हुए लेक्सिकल ज्ञान तक पहुंचने की प्रक्रिया की व्याख्या करना है। इस बात पर आम सहमति है कि ध्वन्यात्मक और शब्दार्थ जानकारी इस प्रक्रिया के लिए महत्वपूर्ण है। हालांकि, इस बात के सबूत जमा हो रहे हैं कि ऑर्थोग्राफिक जानकारी का श्रवण शब्द मान्यता पर भी प्रभाव पड़ सकता है। यह पेपर बोले गए शब्द मान्यता के दो मॉडल प्रस्तुत करता है जो इस प्रक्रिया पर ऑर्थोग्राफी के प्रभाव के बारे में विभिन्न परिकल्पनाओं को तत्काल करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि ये मॉडल विभिन्न तरीकों से मानव जैसे व्यवहार को पुन: पेश करते हैं और बोले गए शब्द मान्यता में ऑर्थोग्राफिक प्रभावों के स्रोत पर भविष्य के शोध के लिए परीक्षण योग्य परिकल्पना प्रदान करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Теории и модели распознавания устных слов направлены на объяснение процесса доступа к лексическим знаниям при акустической реализации словоформы. Существует консенсус в отношении того, что фонологическая и семантическая информация имеет решающее значение для этого процесса. Тем не менее, накапливаются доказательства того, что ортографическая информация может также оказывать влияние на распознавание слуховых слов. В данной работе представлены две модели распознавания устных слов, которые инстанцируют различные гипотезы относительно влияния орфографии на этот процесс. Мы показываем, что эти модели по-разному воспроизводят человекоподобное поведение и предоставляют проверяемые гипотезы для будущих исследований источника орфографических эффектов в распознавании устных слов.', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag teoiricí agus múnlaí aitheantais focal labhartha an próiseas a bhaineann le rochtain a fháil ar eolas foclóireachta a mhíniú nuair a thugtar réadú fuaimiúil ar fhoirm focal. Tá comhdhearcadh ann go bhfuil faisnéis fhóineolaíoch agus shéimeantach ríthábhachtach don phróiseas seo. Mar sin féin, tá fianaise carntha ann go bhféadfadh tionchar a bheith ag faisnéis ortagrafach ar aithint focal éisteachta. Cuireann an páipéar seo i láthair dhá shamhail d’aithint focal labhartha a spreagann hipitéisí éagsúla maidir le tionchar na ortagrafaíochta ar an bpróiseas seo. Léirímid go ndéanann na samhlacha seo iompar cosúil le duine a atáirgeadh ar bhealaí éagsúla agus soláthraíonn siad hipitéisí intástála le haghaidh taighde amach anseo ar fhoinse na n-éifeachtaí ortagrafacha in aithint focal labhartha.', 'ka': 'სიტყვების მოცნობის ტეორიები და მოდელები უნდა განახსნა ლექსიკალური ცნობილების პროცესის მიღება, რომელიც სიტყვების ფორმის აკუსტიური რეალიზაცია. არსებობს კონსენსუსი, რომ ფონოლოგიური და სემონტიური ინფორმაცია ამ პროცესისთვის მნიშვნელოვანია. მაგრამ არსებობს წარმოდგენება, რომ ორტოგრაფიკაური ინფორმაცია შეიძლება ასეთიტორიური სიტყვების განაცნობის შესაძლებლობა. ეს დოკუმენტი აჩვენებს ორი მოდელის სიტყვების განაცნობა, რომელიც განსხვავებული ჰიპოტეზების შესახებ ორტოგრაფიის პროცესი. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ეს მოდელები ადამიანისთვის მონაცემებით განსხვავებული გრძნობა და მომავალეთ შესაძლებელი ჰიპოტეზები მომავალეთ ორტოგრაფიკური ეფექტების გამოსახ', 'hu': 'A beszélt szó felismerésének elméletei és modelljei célja, hogy megmagyarázzák a lexikai tudáshoz való hozzáférés folyamatát egy szóforma akusztikus megvalósításával. Egyetértés van abban, hogy a fonológiai és szemantikai információ elengedhetetlen ebben a folyamatban. Egyre több bizonyíték van azonban arra, hogy az ortográfiai információk hatással lehetnek a hallási szófelismerésre is. A tanulmány a beszélt szó felismerésének két modelljét mutatja be, amelyek különböző hipotéziseket mutatnak be az ortográfia hatására vonatkozóan. Megmutatjuk, hogy ezek a modellek különböző módon reprodukálják az emberi viselkedést, és tesztelhető hipotéziseket nyújtanak a beszélt szófelismerés ortográfiai hatásainak forrására vonatkozó jövőbeli kutatásokhoz.', 'el': 'Θεωρίες και μοντέλα αναγνώρισης προφορικού λόγου στοχεύουν στην εξήγηση της διαδικασίας πρόσβασης στη λεξική γνώση με την ακουστική πραγματοποίηση μιας μορφής λέξης. Υπάρχει συναίνεση ότι οι φωνολογικές και σημασιολογικές πληροφορίες είναι κρίσιμες για τη διαδικασία αυτή. Ωστόσο, υπάρχουν συσσωρευμένες αποδείξεις ότι οι ορθογραφικές πληροφορίες θα μπορούσαν επίσης να έχουν αντίκτυπο στην ακουστική αναγνώριση λέξεων. Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει δύο μοντέλα αναγνώρισης προφορικού λόγου που θέτουν διαφορετικές υποθέσεις σχετικά με την επίδραση της ορθογραφίας στη διαδικασία αυτή. Δείχνουμε ότι αυτά τα μοντέλα αναπαράγουν ανθρώπινη συμπεριφορά με διαφορετικούς τρόπους και παρέχουν δοκιμαστές υποθέσεις για μελλοντική έρευνα σχετικά με την πηγή ορθογραφικών επιδράσεων στην αναγνώριση προφορικού λόγου.', 'it': "Teorie e modelli di riconoscimento della parola parlata mirano a spiegare il processo di accesso alla conoscenza lessicale data una realizzazione acustica di una forma di parola. C'è consenso sul fatto che le informazioni fonologiche e semantiche sono cruciali per questo processo. Tuttavia, ci sono prove accumulate che le informazioni ortografiche potrebbero anche avere un impatto sul riconoscimento uditivo delle parole. Questo articolo presenta due modelli di riconoscimento della parola parlata che istanziano diverse ipotesi circa l'influenza dell'ortografia su questo processo. Mostriamo che questi modelli riproducono comportamenti simili all'uomo in modi diversi e forniscono ipotesi testabili per ricerche future sulla fonte degli effetti ortografici nel riconoscimento delle parole parlate.", 'kk': 'Сөздерді таңдау үлгілері мен теориялары сөздерді таңдау үшін сөздердің акустикалық біліміне қатынау процесін түсініктіру үшін мақсатты. Фонологиялық және семантикалық мәліметтер осы процес үшін маңызды деген консенсус бар. Бірақ, ортографикалық мәліметтер сондай-ақ аудиториялық сөздерді анықтау үшін әсер етеді деген бақылау бар. Бұл қағаз осы процестің ортографиясының әсері туралы әртүрлі гипотезаларды бір-бірінен табылған сөздердің екі үлгілерін көрсетеді. Біз бұл үлгілер адамға ұқсас тәртібін әртүрлі тәртіптермен қайта жасап, сөздерді анықтау үшін болашақ зерттеулердің ортографикалық эффекттерінің көзі туралы сынақтай алатын', 'lt': 'Taikant žodžių pripažinimo teorijas ir modelius, siekiama paaiškinti galimybę naudotis leksinėmis žiniomis, atsižvelgiant į garsinį žodžio formos suvokimą. Sutinkama, kad fonologinė ir semantinė informacija yra labai svarbi šiam procesui. Tačiau yra kaupiamų įrodymų, kad ortografinė informacija taip pat galėtų turėti įtakos auditoriniam žodžių pripažinimui. Šiame dokumente pateikiami du kalbėtojo žodžio pripažinimo modeliai, kurie sukuria skirtingas hipotezes dėl ortografijos poveikio šiam procesui. Mes rodome, kad šie modeliai įvairiais būdais reprodukuoja žmogaus panašų elgesį ir suteikia įrodymus būsimiems tyrimams apie ortografinio poveikio šaltinį kalbos žodžių pripažinime.', 'mk': 'Theories and models of spoken word recognition aim to explain the process of accessing lexical knowledge given an acoustic realization of a word form.  There is consensus that phonological and semantic information is crucial for this process.  However, there is accumulating evidence that orthographic information could also have an impact on auditory word recognition.  Овој весник претставува два модели на препознавање на зборови кои институираат различни хипотези во врска со влијанието на ортографијата на овој процес. Покажуваме дека овие модели репродуктираат човечко однесување на различни начини и обезбедуваат тестирани хипотези за идно истражување на изворот на ортографски ефекти во препознавањето на зборовите.', 'ms': 'Teori dan model pengenalan perkataan bercakap bertujuan untuk menjelaskan proses akses pengetahuan leksikal diberikan pengenalan akustik bentuk perkataan. Ada konsensus bahawa maklumat fonologi dan semantik adalah penting untuk proses ini. Namun, terdapat bukti yang berkumpul bahawa maklumat ortografik juga boleh mempunyai kesan pada pengenalan perkataan pendengar. Kertas ini memperkenalkan dua model pengenalan perkataan bercakap yang memindahkan hipotesis berbeza mengenai pengaruh ortografi pada proses ini. Kami menunjukkan bahawa model ini mereproduksi perilaku seperti manusia dengan cara yang berbeza dan menyediakan hipotesis yang boleh diuji untuk kajian masa depan tentang sumber kesan ortografik dalam pengenalan perkataan bercakap.', 'mt': 'It-teoriji u l-mudelli tar-rikonoxximent tal-kelma mitkellma għandhom l-għan li jispjegaw il-proċess ta’ a ċċess għall-għarfien lexiku minħabba realizzazzjoni akustika ta’ form a ta’ kelma. Hemm kunsens li informazzjoni fonoloġika u semantika hija kruċjali għal dan il-proċess. Madankollu, hemm evidenza akkumulata li informazzjoni ortografika jista’ jkollha impatt ukoll fuq ir-rikonoxximent tal-kliem awdituri. Dan id-dokument jippreżenta żewġ mudelli ta’ rikonoxximent tal-kelma mitkellma li jistimolaw ipotesi differenti dwar l-influwenza tal-ortografija fuq dan il-proċess. Aħna nuru li dawn il-mudelli jirriproduċu mġiba simili għall-bniedem b’modi differenti u jipprovdu ipotesi li jistgħu jiġu ttestjati għal riċerka futura dwar is-sors ta’ effetti ortografiċi fir-rikonoxximent tal-kelma mitkellma.', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്ക് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രക്രിയകളും മാതൃകങ്ങളും വാക്കിന്റെ രൂപത്തില്\u200d ഒരു വാക്കിന്റെ ത ഈ പ്രക്രിയയ്ക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഫോണോളജിക്കൽ വിവരങ്ങൾ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണെന്ന് സമ്മതിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. എന്നാലും, ഓഡിറ്ററി വാക്ക് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിന് ഒരു പ്രഭാവം ഉണ്ടാകുമെന്ന് തെളിവുകള്\u200d ശേഖരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സംസാരിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്ക് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിന്റെ രണ്ടു മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. ഈ പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d വ ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത രീതികളില്\u200d മനുഷ്യരെപ്പോലെയുള്ള സ്വഭാവം പുനര്\u200dമ്മിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. വാക്ക് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിന്റെ സ', 'no': 'Teorier og modeller for talet orderkjenning mål å forklare prosessen for å få tilgang til leksiske kunnskap gjeve ein akustisk realisering av eit ordform. Det er konsensus at fonologiske og semantiske informasjon er viktig for denne prosessen. Det er imidlertid akumulert bevis at ortografisk informasjon kan også ha ein effekt på lydskjenning av ord. Denne papiret viser to modeller for talet orderkjenning som instanserer forskjellige hypotesar om påvirkninga av ortografiet på denne prosessen. Vi viser at desse modelane gjenoppretter menneskelig oppførsel på ulike måtar og gjer testabile hypotesar for framtidige forskning på kjelden av ortografiske effektar i talet orderkjenning.', 'mn': 'Хүсэглэгдсэн үг хүлээн зөвшөөрүүлэх теориуд болон загварууд нь үг хэлбэрийг ойлгохын тулд хэлний мэдлэгийг ашиглах үйл явцыг тайлбарлах зорилго юм. Энэ үйл явцын тулд фонологик болон семантик мэдээлэл чухал гэдгийг ойлгосон. Гэхдээ ортографик мэдээллийг сонсогчийн үг хүлээн зөвшөөрөх нөлөө үзүүлэх боломжтой гэсэн баталгаа цуглуулж байна. Энэ цаас энэ үйл явцдаа ортографикийн нөлөө үзүүлэхэд өөр төрлийн гипотезүүдийг тайлбарладаг хоёр хэлний хүлээн зөвшөөрүүлэх загварыг харуулдаг. Бид эдгээр загварууд хүн төрөлхтний адилхан үйл явдлыг өөр өөр аргаар үржүүлж ирээдүйн судалгаанд ортографик нөлөөлөлийн эх үүсвэр болох шинжлэх ухаан гаргадаг.', 'pl': 'Teorie i modele rozpoznawania słowa mówionego mają na celu wyjaśnienie procesu dostępu do wiedzy leksykalnej przy akustycznej realizacji formy słowa. Istnieje zgoda, że informacja fonologiczna i semantyczna ma kluczowe znaczenie dla tego procesu. Istnieją jednak gromadzące się dowody na to, że informacje ortograficzne mogą również mieć wpływ na rozpoznawanie słowa słuchowego. W artykule przedstawiono dwa modele rozpoznawania słowa mówionego, które tworzą różne hipotezy dotyczące wpływu ortografii na ten proces. Pokazujemy, że modele te reprodukują zachowania podobne do człowieka na różne sposoby i dostarczają testowalnych hipotez dla przyszłych badań nad źródłem efektów ortograficznych w rozpoznawaniu słowa mówionego.', 'ro': 'Teoriile și modelele de recunoaștere a cuvintelor vorbite urmăresc să explice procesul de accesare a cunoștințelor lexicale prin realizarea acustică a unei forme de cuvânt. Există consens că informațiile fonologice și semantice sunt esențiale pentru acest proces. Cu toate acestea, există dovezi acumulate că informațiile ortografice ar putea avea, de asemenea, un impact asupra recunoașterii cuvintelor auditive. Lucrarea prezintă două modele de recunoaștere a cuvintelor vorbite care instanțiază ipoteze diferite privind influența ortografiei asupra acestui proces. Arătăm că aceste modele reproduc comportamentul uman în moduri diferite și oferă ipoteze testabile pentru cercetarea viitoare asupra sursei efectelor ortografice în recunoașterea cuvintelor vorbite.', 'so': 'Tiyaariyada iyo modelalka aqoonsiga hadalka lagu hadlo ayaa ku habboon in lagu caddeeyo baaraandegista aqoonta lexicka, taasoo lagu ogaado foom aad u weyn. Waxaa jirta heshiis in macluumaadka qoyo-nolojiga iyo semiga ay muhiim u tahay baaritaankan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa jira caddeynta urursada in macluumaadka ortografiga sidoo kale saameyn ku yeelan karo aqoonsiga hadalka codsiga. Qoraalkan waxaa soo saara laba tusaale oo ah aqoonsashada hadalka, kaas oo ku saabsan saameyn ku yeelashada hababkan. Waxaynu muujinnaa in qaababkan lagu soo celiyo dabeecada u eg dadka oo kala duduwan, waxaana u fidinayaa fikirrada loo tijaabiyo cilmi mustaqbalka ah oo ku saabsan asalka aqoonsashada afka la hadlay.', 'sv': 'Teorier och modeller för talordigenkänning syftar till att förklara processen för att få tillgång till lexikal kunskap givet en akustisk realisering av en ordform. Det råder enighet om att fonologisk och semantisk information är avgörande för denna process. Det finns dock ackumulerande bevis för att ortografisk information också kan ha en inverkan på hörsel ordigenkänning. Denna uppsats presenterar två modeller av talordigenkänning som instantierar olika hypoteser om ortografins påverkan på denna process. Vi visar att dessa modeller reproducerar människoliknande beteende på olika sätt och ger testbara hypoteser för framtida forskning om källan till ortografiska effekter i talordigenkänning.', 'sr': 'Teorije i modeli priznanja reèi su cilj da objasne proces pristupanja leksičkim znanjima s obzirom na akustiènu realizaciju reèi. Postoji konsenzus da je fonološka i semantička informacija ključna za ovaj proces. Međutim, postoji akumulacija dokaza da ortografska informacija takođe može imati utjecaj na priznanje auditorskih reči. Ovaj papir predstavlja dva modela priznanja reèi koje instantiraju različite hipoteze u vezi utjecaja ortografije na ovaj proces. Pokazujemo da ovi modeli reproduktuju ljudsko ponašanje na različite načine i pružaju testabilne hipoteze za buduće istraživanje izvora ortografskih efekta u prepoznavanju reči.', 'si': 'කතා කරපු වචන පරික්ෂණයේ තීයෝරිස් සහ මොඩල් අදහස් කරනවා ලෙක්සිකල් දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාව පැහැදිලි කරන්න ලෙක්සි මේ පරීක්ෂණය වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියලා තියෙන එක්සන්සුස් තියෙනවා. නමුත්, සාක්ෂික තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අධ්\u200dයානකය වචන අඳුරගන්න. මේ පත්තුවේ කතා කරපු වචන අඳුරණයේ මොඩේල් දෙකක් තියෙනවා මේ පරීක්ෂණයේ වෙනස් හිතාව සඳහා වෙනස් අභිවිධානය අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ මෝඩේල් වගේ මිනිස්සු වගේ හැසිරීම වෙනස් විදියට පරීක්ෂා කරන්න පුළුවන් අනාගතය සඳහා අනාගතයේ පරීක්', 'ur': 'کلمات کی تصدیق کی تئوری اور نمونڈل کا ارادہ ہے کہ ایک کلمات کی تصدیق کرنے کے لئے لکسیکل علم کی پہنچ جانے کی پروسس کو توضیح دیں۔ اس پرسس کے لئے فانولوژیکی اور سیمانٹی معلومات کا اقرار ہے۔ لیکن اس کی نشانیاں جمع کر رہی ہیں کہ اورٹوگرافیک معلومات بھی سننے والی کلمات کی شناخت پر اثر پہنچا سکتی ہے. یہ کاغذ لکھی ہوئی کلمات کی پہچان کی دو نمڈل پیش کرتا ہے کہ اس پرسس پر اورٹوگرافی کے تاثیر کے بارے میں مختلف فرضیوں کو آغاز کرتا ہے۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ موڈلے انسان جیسے رفتار مختلف طریقے سے دوبارہ پیدا کرتے ہیں اور بات کی شناسی میں آگے کی تحقیقات کے لئے آئندہ آئندہ کے مطابق آئندہ کے مطابق آئندہ کا فرض دیتے ہیں.', 'ta': 'பேசும் வார்த்தை அடையாளப்படுத்தலின் தலைப்புகள் மற்றும் மாதிரிகள் ஒரு வார்த்தை வடிவத்தின் மூலம் புரிந்துகொண்டு வரு இந்த செயல்பாட்டிற்கு முக்கியமானது என்று தொழில்நுட்ப மற்றும் அரைத்தும் தகவல் ஆயினும், முன்னிருப்பு தகவல்களும் காட்சி வார்த்தையின் அடையாளத்திற்கு ஒரு பாதிப்பு இருக்கும். இந்த காகிதத்தில் பேசும் வார்த்தை உணர்தலின் இரண்டு மாதிரிகளை கூட்டுகிறது இது வேறு வித்தியாசமான எண்ணங்களை உடனடியாக நாம் இந்த மாதிரிகளை வேறு வழிகளில் மனிதன் போன்ற நடத்தையை மீண்டும் காட்டுகிறோம் மற்றும் பேசும் வார்த்தை அடையாளம் புரியும்', 'uz': "Bu so'zni tasdiqlash uchun mavzu va modellari so'zni tasdiqlash jarayonini o'rganish uchun so'z shaklini aniqlashni anglatadi. Bu vazifa uchun fonologi va semantik maʼlumot muhim. Lekin, ortodografik maʼlumoti qo'yish mumkin, auditor so'zlarini tasdiqlash imkoniyatini qo'yish mumkin. Bu qogʻoz gapiradigan so'zni tasdiqlash uchun ikkita modelni koʻrsatiladi. Bu jarayonining ortografiyasining influensa haqida boshqa fikrlarni o'zgartirish mumkin. Biz bu modellarni o'ylaymiz, odamning turli xuddi o'xshash usullarni o'zgartiradi va kelajakdagi o'qituvchilarning ortografik effektlarining manbasiga o'rganish uchun imtiyozmaydi.", 'vi': 'Lý thuyết và các mô hình nhận dạng từ ngôn ngữ có tiếng nói nhằm giải thích quy trình truy cập kiến thức ngôn ngữ dựa trên sự thực hiện âm thanh của dạng từ. Có sự đồng thuận rằng thông tin về ngôn ngữ và ngữ pháp là điều quan trọng cho tiến trình này. Tuy nhiên, có đầy đủ chứng cứ cho thấy các thông tin cấu hình cũng có thể ảnh hưởng đến việc nhận dạng các từ thính giác. Tờ giấy này đưa ra hai mô hình nhận dạng từ đã nói rằng ngay lập tức các giả thuyết khác nhau về ảnh hưởng của khoái khẩu trong tiến trình này. Chúng tôi cho thấy các mô hình này mô phỏng hành vi giống người theo cách khác nhau và cung cấp các giả thuyết thử nghiệm cho nghiên cứu tương lai về nguồn gốc của các hiệu ứng xương bằng ngôn ngữ.', 'nl': 'Theorieën en modellen van gesproken woordherkenning zijn bedoeld om het proces van toegang tot lexicale kennis te verklaren bij een akoestische realisatie van een woordvorm. Er is consensus dat fonologische en semantische informatie cruciaal is voor dit proces. Er is echter steeds meer bewijs dat orthografische informatie ook een impact kan hebben op de auditieve woordherkenning. Dit artikel presenteert twee modellen van gesproken woordherkenning die verschillende hypothesen over de invloed van orthografie op dit proces instancieren. We laten zien dat deze modellen menselijk gedrag op verschillende manieren reproduceren en bieden testbare hypothesen voor toekomstig onderzoek naar de bron van orthografische effecten in gesproken woordherkenning.', 'hr': 'Teorije i modeli priznanja riječi su cilj objašnjavanja procesa pristupa leksičkim znanjima s obzirom na akustičku realizaciju formulara riječi. Postoji konsenzus da su fonološke i semantičke informacije ključne za ovaj proces. Međutim, postoje skupljanje dokaza da ortografska informacija također može utjecati na priznanje slušnih riječi. Ovaj papir predstavlja dva modela priznanja riječi koje instantiraju različite hipoteze u vezi utjecaja ortografije na ovaj proces. Pokazujemo da se ovi modeli reproduktiraju ljudsko ponašanje na različite načine i pružaju testabilne hipoteze za buduće istraživanje izvora ortografskih učinka u prepoznavanju riječi.', 'bg': 'Теориите и моделите за разпознаване на речни думи имат за цел да обяснят процеса на достъп до лексикалното знание при акустична реализация на думична форма. Съществува консенсус, че фонологичната и семантичната информация е от решаващо значение за този процес. Съществуват обаче натрупващи доказателства, че ортографската информация може да окаже влияние и върху разпознаването на слухови думи. Статията представя два модела за разпознаване на говорени думи, които поставят различни хипотези относно влиянието на ортографията върху този процес. Показваме, че тези модели възпроизвеждат човешко поведение по различни начини и предоставят тестуеми хипотези за бъдещи изследвания на източника на ортографски ефекти при разпознаването на говорени думи.', 'da': 'Teorier og modeller for taleordgenkendelse har til formål at forklare processen med adgang til leksikal viden givet en akustisk realisering af en ordform. Der er enighed om, at fonologisk og semantisk information er afgørende for denne proces. Der er imidlertid akkumulerende beviser for, at ortografiske oplysninger også kan have en indvirkning på auditiv ordgenkendelse. Denne artikel præsenterer to modeller for talt ord anerkendelse, der instantierer forskellige hypoteser vedrørende ortografiens indflydelse på denne proces. Vi viser, at disse modeller reproducerer menneskelignende adfærd på forskellige måder og giver testbare hypoteser til fremtidig forskning om kilden til ortografiske effekter i talt ord genkendelse.', 'de': 'Theorien und Modelle der gesprochenen Worterkennung zielen darauf ab, den Prozess des Zugangs zu lexikalischem Wissen bei einer akustischen Realisierung einer Wortform zu erklären. Es besteht Konsens darüber, dass phonologische und semantische Informationen für diesen Prozess entscheidend sind. Es gibt jedoch immer mehr Hinweise darauf, dass orthographische Informationen auch Auswirkungen auf die auditive Worterkennung haben könnten. Diese Arbeit stellt zwei Modelle der gesprochenen Worterkennung vor, die unterschiedliche Hypothesen bezüglich des Einflusses der Orthographie auf diesen Prozess formulieren. Wir zeigen, dass diese Modelle menschliches Verhalten auf unterschiedliche Weise reproduzieren und liefern testbare Hypothesen für zukünftige Forschungen zur Quelle orthographischer Effekte in der Spracherkennung.', 'fa': 'تئوری و مدل شناسایی کلمات صحبت را هدف می\u200cدهد که فرایند دسترسی به دانش زبانی را توضیح دهد، به عنوان تأکید آکوستیک یک فرم کلمات. موافقت وجود دارد که اطلاعات تلفن شناسی و semantic برای این فرایند مهم است. با این حال، مدرک جمع کردن وجود دارد که اطلاعات orthographic هم می تواند اثر بر شناختن کلمات شنوایی داشته باشد. این کاغذ دو مدل از شناسایی کلمات صحبت می\u200cکند که فرضیه\u200cهای متفاوتی را در مورد تاثیر ورتوگرافی بر این فرایند نازل می\u200cکند. ما نشان می دهیم که این مدلها رفتار مانند انسان را به طریق مختلف بازآفرینی می کنند و فرضیه های آزمایش قابل تأکید برای تحقیقات آینده در منبع اثرات orthographic در شناسایی کلمات صحبت می کنند.', 'id': 'Teori dan model pengenalan kata berbicara bermaksud menjelaskan proses akses pengetahuan lexik diberikan kesadaran akustik bentuk kata. Ada konsensus bahwa informasi fonologi dan semantis penting untuk proses ini. Namun, ada bukti yang mengumpulkan bahwa informasi ortografik juga dapat mempengaruhi pengakuan kata pendengar. Kertas ini mempersembahkan dua model pengakuan kata berbicara yang mengakibatkan hipotesis yang berbeda mengenai pengaruh ortografi pada proses ini. Kami menunjukkan bahwa model ini mereproduksi perilaku seperti manusia dengan cara yang berbeda dan menyediakan hipotesis yang dapat diuji untuk penelitian masa depan tentang sumber efek ortografik dalam pengenalan kata berbicara.', 'ko': '구어 단어 식별의 이론과 모델은 단어 형식의 성학적 실현에서 어휘 지식을 얻는 과정을 설명하는 데 목적을 둔다.사람들은 음성과 의미 정보가 이 과정에 매우 중요하다고 일치된 견해를 가지고 있다.그러나 점점 더 많은 증거에 의하면 정자법 정보도 청각 단어 식별에 영향을 미칠 수 있다.본고는 두 가지 구어어 식별 모델을 제시했는데 이들은 정자법이 이 과정에 미친 영향에 대한 서로 다른 가설을 예로 들었다.우리는 이러한 모델이 서로 다른 방식으로 유인 행위를 재현하고 앞으로 구어어 식별에서 정교효과의 출처를 연구하는 데 검증할 수 있는 가설을 제공할 수 있음을 발견했다.', 'sw': 'Tamko na mifano ya kutambua maneno yanayozungumzwa lengo la kuelezea mchakato wa kupata maarifa ya lexico kwa sababu ya kutambua hali ya msisimu wa neno. Kuna makubaliano kwamba taarifa za kifolojia na sekundi ni muhimu kwa mchakato huu. However, there is accumulating evidence that orthographic information could also have an impact on auditory word recognition.  Gazeti hili linaleta mifano miwili ya kutambua neno linalozungumzwa kwamba kuanzisha imani tofauti kuhusu ushawishi wa kirahisi katika mchakato huu. Tunaonyesha kuwa mifano hii inabadilisha tabia kama binadamu kwa namna tofauti na kutoa nadhani zinazojaribiwa kwa utafiti wa baadaye kuhusu chanzo cha madhara ya kiografia katika kutambuliwa maneno yanayozungumzwa.', 'tr': 'Gürleýän söz tanamasynyň teoriýasy we nusgalary bir söz biçiminiň akustik düşünmesini düşündirmek üçin maksadylar. Bu proses üçin fonolojik we semantik maglumaty möhüm bolmagy bardyr. Ýöne, ortografiýa maglumatyň sesli sözleri tanamagyna täsirli bolup bilendigine garaşýar. Bu kagyzyň bu prosesde ortografiýanyň täsiri barada gürleşýän sözlerin tanamagyň iki nusgasyny görkezýär. Biz bu nusgalar adam ýaly davranışlary farklı yönlerde täzeden edip, gürleýän sözlerin tanyşynyň ortografiýa etkisi barada gelejek araştyrmalar üçin barlap biljek hypotezeler getirip bilýäris.', 'af': "Teories en modele van gespreek woord herken doel om die proses van toegang tot leksies kennis te verduidelik wat 'n akustiese realisasie van 'n woord vorm gegee het. Daar is konsensus dat fonologiese en semantiese inligting vir hierdie proses krysbaar is. Maar daar is die bevestiging wat orthografiese inligting ook 'n invloek kan hê op auditoriese woord herkening. Hierdie papier stel twee modele van gespreek woord herken wat verskillende hipotees aangaande die influens van ortografie op hierdie proses ontvang. Ons wys dat hierdie modele menslike gedrag op verskillende maniere reproduseer en toestelbare hipotees vir toekomstige ondersoek op die bron van orthografiese effekte in spreek woord herken.", 'sq': 'Teoriat dhe modelet e njohjes së fjalës së folur synojnë të shpjegojnë procesin e aksesit të njohjes lexike të dhënë një kuptim akustik të një forme fjale. Ka konsensus se informacioni fonologjik dhe semantik është vendimtar për këtë proces. Megjithatë, ka prova që informacioni ortografik mund të ketë gjithashtu një ndikim në njohjen dëgjuese të fjalëve. Kjo letër paraqet dy modele të njohjes së fjalëve të folura që nxisin hipoteza të ndryshme lidhur me ndikimin e ortografisë në këtë proces. We show that these models reproduce human-like behavior in different ways and provide testable hypotheses for future research on the source of orthographic effects in spoken word recognition.', 'am': 'የቃላትን ማስታወቂያ እና ምሳሌዎች ለቃላት መልዕክት መግለጫ የሚችል የሌክሲካዊ እውቀትን ለማግኘት ነው፡፡ የፎሎጂ እና የsemantic መረጃ ለዚህ ፕሮጀክት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የኦሮግራፊ መረጃዎች የድምፅ ቃላት ማስታወቂያውን በኩል የሚያስጨንቀው ማስረጃ አሉ፡፡ ይህ ገጽ የንግግር ቃላት ማስታወቂያውን ሁለት ምሳሌ ያሳየዋል፡፡ እነዚህ ምሳሌዎች የሰውን የሚመስል ሁኔታ በልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ልማድ እንዲያሳየው እና ለኋለኛይቱ ትምህርት ለመፍጠር የኦሮግራፊ የውጤት ግንኙነትን በሚናገሩት ቃላት ማስታወቂያ ምንጭ እንዲፈትኑ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'az': 'Sözlü kəlmə tanımasının teori və modelləri bir kəlmə formasının akustik gerçəkləşdirilməsini təsdiqləmək üçün məqsədilə təsdiqlənmək istəyirlər. Fonolojik və semantik məlumatların bu proses üçün çox mövcuddur. Ancaq, ortografik məlumatların səslənib sözlərin tanımasına da bir təsiri olaraq təsirləndiriləcəyini təsdiqləyən dəlillər də var. Bu kağıt bu proses üzərində ortografiya təsiri barəsində müxtəlif hipotezlərin müxtəlif olduğu sözlərin tanımasının iki modeli göstərir. Biz bu modellərin insan kimi davranışlarını fərqli yollarda təkrarlayır və gələcək araştırmaların, sözlərin tanımasında ortografik etkisinin mənbəsini təkrarlayır.', 'bn': 'কথা বলা শব্দের স্বীকারের থিওরি এবং মডেল ব্যাখ্যা করার উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে একটি শব্দের ফর্মের ব্যাপারে লেক্সিক্যাল জ্ঞান এই প্রক্রিয়ার জন্য ফোনোলজিক এবং সামেন্টিক তথ্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। তবে প্রমাণ সংগ্রহ করা হচ্ছে যে অডিওরি শব্দের স্বীকৃতির উপর অর্থগ্রাফিক তথ্য প্রভাব ফেলতে পারে। This paper presents two models of spoken word recognition that instantiate different hypotheses regarding the influence of orthography on this process.  আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই মডেল বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভ', 'hy': 'Խոսված բառերի ճանաչության տեսությունները և մոդելները նպատակում են բառի ձևի ձայնային հասկանալու համար բացատրել լեքսիկական գիտելիքների հասանելիության գործընթացը: Կա համաձայնություն, որ ֆոնոլոգիական և սեմանտիկ ինֆորմացիան կարևոր է այս գործընթացի համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, կա հավաքվող ապացույցներ, որ օրթոգրաֆիկ տեղեկատվությունը կարող է նաև ազդել լսողական բառերի ճանաչման վրա: Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է խոսված բառերի ճանաչման երկու մոդել, որոնք ներկայացնում են տարբեր հիպոթեզներ, որոնք վերաբերում են օրտոգրաֆիայի ազդեցության վրա: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս մոդելները վերարտադրում են մարդկային նման վարքագիծը տարբեր ձևերով և ապագա ուսումնասիրության համար ապացույցված հիպոթեզներ են տալիս խոսված բառերի ճանաչման օրտոգրաֆիկ էֆեկտների աղբյուրի մասին:', 'bs': 'Teorije i modeli priznanja riječi su cilj objašnjavanja procesa pristupa leksičkim znanjima s obzirom na akustičku realizaciju formulara riječi. Postoji konsenzus da je fonološka i semantička informacija ključna za ovaj proces. Međutim, postoji akumulacija dokaza da ortografska informacija također može utjecati na priznanje auditorskih riječi. Ovaj papir predstavlja dva modela priznanja riječi koje instantiraju različite hipoteze u vezi utjecaja ortografije na ovaj proces. Pokazujemo da se ovi modeli reproduciraju ljudsko ponašanje na različite načine i pružaju testabilne hipoteze za buduće istraživanje izvora ortografskih učinka u prepoznavanju riječi.', 'cs': 'Teorie a modely rozpoznávání mluveného slova mají za cíl vysvětlit proces přístupu k lexikálním znalostem při akustické realizaci slovní formy. Existuje shoda, že fonologické a sémantické informace jsou pro tento proces klíčové. Existují však shromažďující se důkazy, že ortografické informace by mohly mít také vliv na sluchové rozpoznávání slov. Tento článek představuje dva modely rozpoznávání mluveného slova, které vytvářejí různé hypotézy týkající se vlivu pravopisu na tento proces. Ukazujeme, že tyto modely reprodukují lidské chování různými způsoby a poskytují testovatelné hypotézy pro budoucí výzkum zdroje ortografických efektů v rozpoznávání mluveného slova.', 'et': 'Rõnatuvastuse teooriate ja mudelite eesmärk on selgitada leksikaalsetele teadmistele juurdepääsu protsessi sõnavormi akustilise realiseerimise korral. On üksmeel, et fonoloogiline ja semantiline teave on selle protsessi jaoks otsustava tähtsusega. Siiski on kogunenud tõendeid selle kohta, et ortograafiline teave võib mõjutada ka kuulmisõna äratundmist. Käesolevas töös esitatakse kaks räägitud sõnatuvastuse mudelit, mis tekitavad erinevaid hüpoteesid ortograafia mõju kohta sellele protsessile. Näitame, et need mudelid reprodutseerivad inimese sarnast käitumist erinevatel viisidel ja annavad testitavaid hüpoteese tulevaseks uurimiseks ortograafiliste efektide allika kohta kõnelevate sõnade tuvastamisel.', 'fi': 'Puhutun sanan tunnistuksen teoriat ja mallit pyrkivät selittämään leksikaalisen tiedon saantiprosessia sanamuodon akustisen toteutumisen yhteydessä. On yksimielisyyttä siitä, että fonologinen ja semanttinen tieto on ratkaisevan tärkeää tässä prosessissa. On kuitenkin kertynyt näyttöä siitä, että ortografisella tiedolla voi olla vaikutusta myös kuuloiseen sanantunnistukseen. Tässä työssä esitellään kaksi puhuttujen sanojen tunnistusmallia, jotka synnyttävät erilaisia hypoteeseja ortografian vaikutuksesta tähän prosessiin. Osoitamme, että nämä mallit toistavat ihmisen kaltaista käyttäytymistä eri tavoin ja tarjoavat testattavia hypoteeseja tulevalle tutkimukselle ortografisten vaikutusten lähteestä puhuttujen sanojen tunnistuksessa.', 'ca': "Les teories i els models del reconeixement de paraules parlades tenen l'objectiu d'explicar el procés d'accés al coneixement lèxic, donant una conciència acústica d'una form a de paraula. Hi ha consens que la informació fonològica i semàntica és crucial per aquest procés. No obstant això, hi ha proves acumulades que la informació ortogràfica també pot influir en el reconeixement auditiu de paraules. This paper presents two models of spoken word recognition that instantiate different hypotheses regarding the influence of orthography on this process.  Mostrem que aquests models reprodueixen el comportament humà de diferents maneres i proporcionen hipòtesis probables per a futures recerca sobre la font d'efectes ortogràfics en el reconeixement de paraules parlades.", 'sk': 'Teorije in modeli prepoznavanja govorjenih besed želijo pojasniti proces dostopa do leksikalnega znanja ob akustični realizaciji besedne oblike. Obstaja soglasje, da so fonološke in semantične informacije ključnega pomena za ta proces. Vendar pa se zbirajo dokazi, da bi ortografske informacije lahko vplivale tudi na slušno prepoznavanje besed. V prispevku sta predstavljena dva modela prepoznavanja govorjenih besed, ki uvajata različne hipoteze o vplivu ortografije na ta proces. Pokazali smo, da ti modeli reproducirajo človeku podobno vedenje na različne načine in zagotavljajo testirane hipoteze za prihodnje raziskave vira ortografskih učinkov pri prepoznavanju govorjenih besed.', 'ha': "Tsori da misãlai na ganin maganar da aka faɗa yana aimar ya bayyana aikin zartar da za'a iya haɗa ilmi na leksisi da aka gane wani fomat na kalma. There is consensus that phonological and semantic information is crucial for this process.  Amma, akwai samun bayani cẽwa, agare na ortografi za'a sami wani matsayi kan ganin magana na saurari. Wannan takardan na gaya misãlai biyu na ganin maganar da aka faɗa, mai ƙayyade misãlai daban-dabam game da muhimmar ortografi kan wannan aikin. Tuna nũna cewa waɗannan misãlai za'a mayar da aikin mutane a cikin hanyõyi dabam-daban kuma ke sami misãlai da ake jarraba wa masu karatun kalmõmi masu yiwuwa a kan ƙarshen karatun masu tsari ga fassarar ortografi da ake faɗa.", 'jv': 'Terojer karo model sing sampeyan kelas kuwi nggunakake iki dadi pancen ngerasah perusahaan langkung kelas saiki wis an a perusahaan akustik dhéwé kuwi pawaran. Ana sampeyan pancene kang dipolengkang karo sematik informasi aku dikarepasan kanggo ngenggo iki. Nanging, ana karo ngnggaweke tualisang kuwi, akeh informasi ortograf iso nggawe nguasai percoksi kanggo awak dhéwé kuwi mau. Perintah iki dadi sistem sing sampek arep awak dhéwé, nik kuwi sawetara pancen dudu suputes mengko perusahaan ortoggraphi sing nggawe barang iki. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem iki bakal kelompok tarjamahan ing pancen dumadhi iki ngono nggawe supoyata ujaran kanggo masalah bantuan ingkang sampek dhéwé', 'bo': 'ས Theories and models of spoken word recognition aim to explain the process of accessing lexical knowledge given an acoustic realization of a word form. There is consensus that phonological and semantic information is crucial for this process. ཡིན་ནའང་། དབྱེ་རིག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱིས་རྣམ་པ་ཚོར་རྟོག་པའི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱང་མཐོང་བ་ཞིག་ཡོད། ཤོག ང་ཚོས་མིག', 'he': 'תיאוריות ודוגמנים של זיהוי מילים מדברים מכוונים להסביר את התהליך של גישה לידע לקסי בהתחשב בהבנה אקוסטית של צורת מילה. There is consensus that phonological and semantic information is crucial for this process.  However, there is accumulating evidence that orthographic information could also have an impact on auditory word recognition.  העבודה הזו מציגה שני דוגמנים של זיהוי מילים מדברות שמפתחים היפותזיות שונות בנוגע לשפעה של אורטוגרפיה על התהליך הזה. We show that these models reproduce human-like behavior in different ways and provide testable hypotheses for future research on the source of orthographic effects in spoken word recognition.'}
{'en': 'Automatically Cataloging Scholarly Articles using Library of Congress Subject Headings', 'ar': 'فهرسة المقالات العلمية تلقائيًا باستخدام عناوين موضوعات مكتبة الكونجرس', 'fr': "Catalogage automatique des articles savants à l'aide des vedettes-matières de la Library of", 'es': 'Catalogación automática de artículos académicos mediante encabezados de materias de la Biblioteca del Congreso', 'pt': 'Catalogação automática de artigos acadêmicos usando cabeçalhos de assunto da Biblioteca do Congresso', 'hi': 'कांग्रेस विषय शीर्षकों के पुस्तकालय का उपयोग कर विद्वानों के लेखों को स्वचालित रूप से सूचीबद्ध करना', 'ja': '米国議会図書館の件名を使用して学術記事を自動的にカタログ化する', 'zh': '用美国国会图书馆题自编目学术文章', 'ru': 'Автоматическая каталогизация научных статей с использованием заголовков тем Библиотеки Конгресса', 'ga': 'Ailt Scoláireacha a Chatalógú go huathoibríoch ag úsáid Ceannteidil Ábhar Leabharlann na Comhdhála', 'ka': 'კონგრესის მისამართების ლიბური გამოყენებული სკოლური არტიკების ავტომატურად კატალოგურაცია', 'el': 'Αυτόματη ταξινόμηση επιστημονικών άρθρων χρησιμοποιώντας τη βιβλιοθήκη του Κογκρέσου Θέματα επικεφαλίδες', 'hu': 'Tudományos cikkek automatikus katalógusa a Kongresszusi Könyvtár segítségével', 'it': 'Catalogazione automatica degli articoli scolastici utilizzando la Biblioteca del Congresso', 'kk': 'Конгресс тақырыбының мектептерінің атауларын қолданып, мектептерді автоматты түрде каталогтау мақалалары', 'lt': 'Automatiškai kataloguojami moksliniai straipsniai naudojant kongreso bibliotekos dalykų antraštes', 'mk': 'Автоматски каталогирање на научни статии со користење на насловите на темата на библиотеката на Конгресот', 'ms': 'Mengkatalog secara automatik Artikel Belajar menggunakan Pengepala Subjek Pustaka Kongres', 'mt': 'Artikli Skolari ta’ Katalogazzjoni Awtomatika bl-użu tal-Intestaturi tas-Suġġetti tal-Librerija tal-Kungress', 'ml': 'കോണ്\u200dഗ്രേസിന്റെ ലൈബ്രറി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന സ്കോളില്\u200d കലാക്രമങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വയമായി വിതരണം ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'no': 'Automatisk katalogerer skolarartiklar med biblioteket av temahovud i Congress', 'pl': 'Automatyczne katalogowanie artykułów naukowych za pomocą nagłówków Biblioteki Kongresu', 'ro': 'Catalogarea automată a articolelor școlare utilizând Biblioteca Congresului', 'sr': 'Автоматично катализирање школских членова користећи библиотеку конгресских предмета', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විද්\u200dයාපෘතිය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විද්\u200dයාපෘතිය ස්', 'so': 'Automatically Catalog Scholarly Articles using Library of Congress Subject Heads', 'sv': 'Automatisk katalogisering av vetenskapliga artiklar med hjälp av Kongressbiblioteket Ämnesområden', 'ta': 'காங்கிரஸ் பொருள் தலைப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி தானாகவே அட்டவணை கட்டுரைகள்', 'ur': 'کانگرس سرگوشی سرگوشیوں کے لائبرہ کے مطابق اسکولری سرگوشیوں کو استعمال کرتا ہے', 'mn': 'Автоматтыг Сургуулийн Манлалыг Конгресс Сургуулийн Сургууль Сургууль Сургууль Сургууль', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Tự động mô hình các bài học học sử dụng Văn phòng đối tượng Quốc hội', 'bg': 'Автоматично каталогизиране на научни статии с помощта на заглавията на темата на библиотеката на конгреса', 'nl': 'Automatisch catalogiseren van wetenschappelijke artikelen met behulp van Library of Congress Onderwerpen Koppen', 'hr': 'Automatično katalogiranje školskih članaka koristeći knjižnicu predsjednika Kongresa', 'da': 'Automatisk katalogisering af videnskabelige artikler ved hjælp af Library of Congress Emneoverskrifter', 'de': 'Automatische Katalogisierung wissenschaftlicher Artikel mithilfe der Library of Congress-Überschriften', 'id': 'Mengkatalog secara otomatis artikel sekolah menggunakan Headings Subjek Pustaka Kongres', 'fa': 'با استفاده از کتابخانه\u200cی عنوان کنگره\u200cها، مجموعه\u200cهای مدرسه\u200cی کاتلوژی خودکار', 'ko': '국회 도서관 주제 제목을 사용하여 학술 문장을 자동으로 편찬하다', 'sw': 'Makala yenyewe ya Makala ya Kishule kwa kutumia Maktaba ya Maudhui ya Uchaguzi wa Congress', 'tr': 'Okuwçy Mazmunlar', 'af': 'Automaties Katalogeer Skolbare Artikels gebruik Biblioteek van Kongres Onderwerp', 'sq': 'Automatically Catalogging Scholarly Articles using Library of Congress Subject Headings', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'bn': 'কংগ্রেসের বিষয়ের শিরোনাম ব্যবহার করে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে স্কোলালি আর্টিকেল', 'az': 'Kongres Mevzusu Başlıqları Library of Congress', 'bs': 'Automatski katalogiranje školskih članaka koristeći biblioteku predmeta Kongresa', 'cs': 'Automatické katalogizování vědeckých článků pomocí Knihovny Kongresu', 'ca': 'Cataloguint automàticament articles escolars utilitzant la Biblioteca de Subjectes del Congrés', 'et': 'Teaduslike artiklite automaatne kataloogimine Kongressi raamatukogu teemapealkirjadega', 'hy': 'Comment', 'fi': 'Tieteellisten artikkelien automaattinen luettelointi käyttäen Library of Congress Aiheotsikoita', 'jv': "Menu item to Open 'Search for Open Files' dialog", 'he': 'Automatically Cataloging Scholarly Articles using Library of Congress Subject Headings', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Avtomatsko katalogiranje znanstvenih člankov z uporabo naslovov knjižnice kongresa', 'bo': 'Automatically Cataloging Scholarly Articles using Library of Congress Subject Headings'}
{'en': 'Institutes are required to catalog their articles with proper subject headings so that the users can easily retrieve relevant articles from the institutional repositories. However, due to the rate of proliferation of the number of articles in these repositories, it is becoming a challenge to manually catalog the newly added articles at the same pace. To address this challenge, we explore the feasibility of automatically annotating articles with Library of Congress Subject Headings (LCSH). We first use web scraping to extract keywords for a collection of articles from the Repository Analytics and Metrics Portal (RAMP). Then, we map these keywords to LCSH names for developing a gold-standard dataset. As a case study, using the subset of Biology-related LCSH concepts, we develop predictive models by formulating this task as a multi-label classification problem. Our experimental results demonstrate the viability of this approach for predicting LCSH for scholarly articles.', 'fr': "Les instituts sont tenus de cataloguer leurs articles avec des vedettes-matières appropriées afin que les utilisateurs puissent facilement récupérer les articles pertinents dans les référentiels institutionnels. Cependant, en raison du taux de prolifération du nombre d'articles dans ces référentiels, il devient difficile de cataloguer manuellement les articles nouvellement ajoutés au même rythme. Pour relever ce défi, nous explorons la possibilité d'annoter automatiquement les articles avec les vedettes-matières de la Library of Congress (LCSH). Nous utilisons d'abord le Web Scraping pour extraire des mots-clés pour une collection d'articles à partir du portail Repository Analytics and Metrics Portal (RAMP). Ensuite, nous associons ces mots-clés aux noms LCSH pour développer un ensemble de données de référence. En tant qu'étude de cas, en utilisant le sous-ensemble de concepts LCSH liés à la biologie, nous développons des modèles prédictifs en formulant cette tâche comme un problème de classification multi-étiquettes. Nos résultats expérimentaux démontrent la viabilité de cette approche pour prédire la LCSH pour les articles savants.", 'ar': 'يُطلب من المعاهد فهرسة مقالاتها بعناوين موضوعات مناسبة بحيث يمكن للمستخدمين بسهولة استرداد المقالات ذات الصلة من مستودعات المؤسسة. ومع ذلك ، نظرًا لمعدل انتشار عدد المقالات في هذه المستودعات ، فقد أصبح من الصعب فهرسة المقالات المضافة حديثًا يدويًا بنفس الوتيرة. لمواجهة هذا التحدي ، نستكشف جدوى إضافة تعليقات توضيحية للمقالات تلقائيًا باستخدام عناوين موضوعات مكتبة الكونجرس (LCSH). نستخدم أولاً كشط الويب لاستخراج الكلمات الأساسية لمجموعة من المقالات من بوابة تحليلات وقياسات المستودع (RAMP). بعد ذلك ، نقوم بتعيين هذه الكلمات الرئيسية لأسماء LCSH لتطوير مجموعة بيانات قياسية ذهبية. كدراسة حالة ، باستخدام مجموعة فرعية من مفاهيم LCSH المتعلقة بالبيولوجيا ، نقوم بتطوير نماذج تنبؤية من خلال صياغة هذه المهمة كمشكلة تصنيف متعددة التسميات. توضح نتائجنا التجريبية جدوى هذا النهج للتنبؤ بـ LCSH للمقالات العلمية.', 'pt': 'Os institutos são obrigados a catalogar seus artigos com cabeçalhos de assunto apropriados para que os usuários possam facilmente recuperar artigos relevantes dos repositórios institucionais. No entanto, devido à taxa de proliferação do número de artigos nesses repositórios, está se tornando um desafio catalogar manualmente os artigos recém-adicionados no mesmo ritmo. Para enfrentar esse desafio, exploramos a viabilidade de anotar automaticamente os artigos com o Library of Congress Subject Headings (LCSH). Primeiro, usamos web scraping para extrair palavras-chave para uma coleção de artigos do Repository Analytics and Metrics Portal (RAMP). Em seguida, mapeamos essas palavras-chave para nomes LCSH para desenvolver um conjunto de dados padrão-ouro. Como estudo de caso, usando o subconjunto de conceitos de LCSH relacionados à Biologia, desenvolvemos modelos preditivos formulando essa tarefa como um problema de classificação multirrótulo. Nossos resultados experimentais demonstram a viabilidade dessa abordagem para prever LCSH para artigos acadêmicos.', 'es': 'Los institutos están obligados a catalogar sus artículos con encabezados de temas adecuados para que los usuarios puedan recuperar fácilmente los artículos relevantes de los repositorios institucionales. Sin embargo, debido a la tasa de proliferación del número de artículos en estos repositorios, se está convirtiendo en un desafío catalogar manualmente los artículos recién agregados al mismo ritmo. Para abordar este desafío, exploramos la viabilidad de anotar automáticamente los artículos con los encabezados de temas de la Biblioteca del Congreso (LCSH). Primero utilizamos el raspado web para extraer palabras clave para una colección de artículos del Portal de Análisis y Métricas de Repositorios (RAMP). Luego, asignamos estas palabras clave a los nombres de LCSH para desarrollar un conjunto de datos de referencia. Como estudio de caso, utilizando el subconjunto de conceptos de LCSH relacionados con la biología, desarrollamos modelos predictivos mediante la formulación de esta tarea como un problema de clasificación de múltiples etiquetas. Nuestros resultados experimentales demuestran la viabilidad de este enfoque para predecir la LCSH para artículos académicos.', 'hi': 'संस्थानों को अपने लेखों को उचित विषय शीर्षकों के साथ सूचीबद्ध करने की आवश्यकता होती है ताकि उपयोगकर्ता आसानी से संस्थागत भंडारों से प्रासंगिक लेखों को पुनः प्राप्त कर सकें। हालांकि, इन भंडारों में लेखों की संख्या के प्रसार की दर के कारण, नए जोड़े गए लेखों को उसी गति से मैन्युअल रूप से सूचीबद्ध करना एक चुनौती बन रहा है। इस चुनौती को संबोधित करने के लिए, हम लाइब्रेरी ऑफ कांग्रेस सब्जेक्ट हेडिंग्स (एलसीएसएच) के साथ लेखों को स्वचालित रूप से एनोटेट करने की व्यवहार्यता का पता लगाते हैं। हम पहले रिपॉजिटरी Analytics और मैट्रिक्स पोर्टल (RAMP) से लेखों के संग्रह के लिए कीवर्ड निकालने के लिए वेब स्क्रैपिंग का उपयोग करते हैं। फिर, हम इन कीवर्ड को एक स्वर्ण-मानक डेटासेट विकसित करने के लिए LCSH नामों पर मैप करते हैं। एक मामले के अध्ययन के रूप में, जीव विज्ञान से संबंधित एलसीएसएच अवधारणाओं के सबसेट का उपयोग करके, हम इस कार्य को बहु-लेबल वर्गीकरण समस्या के रूप में तैयार करके पूर्वानुमानित मॉडल विकसित करते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम विद्वानों के लेखों के लिए LCSH की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए इस दृष्टिकोण की व्यवहार्यता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'zh': '所司宜用主题题编目之,以用户轻从库中检索。 然以此存储库文数之激增,以同其速手动编目新添之文,正为一项。 为此挑战,探用美国国会图书馆题(LCSH)自注文可行性。 首用 Web 取存储库及指标门户 (RAMP) 取文章合关键字。 然后射此关键字于LCSH名,以开黄金之数。 为案:用生物学相关LCSH名子集,以公式多标类开测。 吾实验证其术文LCSH之可行性。', 'ja': '研究所は、適切な件名の見出しで記事をカタログ化し、ユーザーが機関リポジトリから関連記事を簡単に取得できるようにする必要があります。しかし、これらのリポジトリの記事数の急増により、新たに追加された記事を同じペースで手動でカタログ化することが課題となりつつある。この課題に対処するために、米国議会図書館の件名（ LCSH ）を使用して記事に自動的に注釈を付けることの実現可能性を検討します。まず、Webスクレイピングを使用して、リポジトリ分析と指標ポータル(RAMP)から記事のコレクションのキーワードを抽出します。次に、これらのキーワードをLCSH名にマッピングして、ゴールドスタンダードのデータセットを開発します。ケーススタディとして、生物学関連のLCSH概念のサブセットを使用して、このタスクをマルチラベル分類問題として定式化することにより、予測モデルを開発します。私たちの実験結果は、学術論文のLCSHを予測するためのこのアプローチの生存可能性を示しています。', 'ru': 'Институты обязаны каталогизировать свои статьи с соответствующими тематическими заголовками, с тем чтобы пользователи могли легко извлекать соответствующие статьи из институциональных репозиториев. Однако в связи с темпами увеличения числа статей в этих хранилищах становится все труднее вручную каталогизировать вновь добавленные статьи в том же темпе. Для решения этой проблемы мы изучаем возможность автоматической аннотации статей с заголовками Библиотеки Конгресса (LCSH). Для извлечения ключевых слов из коллекции статей из портала аналитики и метрик репозиториев (RAMP) мы сначала используем веб-скреб. Затем мы сопоставляем эти ключевые слова с именами LCSH для разработки датасета золотого стандарта. В качестве тематического исследования, используя подмножество концепций LCSH, связанных с биологией, мы разрабатываем прогностические модели, формулируя эту задачу как многоядерную классификационную задачу. Наши экспериментальные результаты демонстрируют жизнеспособность этого подхода для прогнозирования LCSH для научных статей.', 'ga': 'Ceanglaítear ar institiúidí a gcuid alt a chatalógú le ceannteidil ábhair chearta ionas gur féidir le húsáideoirí na hailt ábhartha a aisghabháil go héasca ó na stórtha institiúideacha. Mar sin féin, mar gheall ar an ráta méadaithe ar líon na n-alt sna stórtha seo, tá sé ag éirí ina dhúshlán na hailt nua-bhreise a chatalógú de láimh ag an luas céanna. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an dúshlán seo, déanaimid iniúchadh ar an bhféidearthacht altanna a anótáil go huathoibríoch le Ceannteidil Ábhar Leabharlann na Comhdhála (LCSH). Bainimid úsáid as scríobadh gréasáin ar dtús chun eochairfhocail a bhaint as bailiúchán alt ón Tairseach Anailíse agus Méadracht Stór (RAMP). Ansin, déanaimid na heochairfhocail seo a mhapáil chuig ainmneacha LCSH chun tacar sonraí órchaighdeán a fhorbairt. Mar chás-staidéar, ag baint úsáide as an bhfothacar de choincheapa LCSH a bhaineann leis an mBitheolaíocht, forbraímid samhlacha réamh-mheastacháin tríd an tasc seo a cheapadh mar fhadhb aicmithe illipéid. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí turgnamhacha inmharthanacht an chur chuige seo chun LCSH a thuar le haghaidh earraí léannta.', 'ka': 'ინსტისტუტები უნდა საჭირო მათი არქეტების კატალოგის შესახებ სეტისტუტების მისახებ, რადგან მომხმარებელი ადვილად შეუძლიათ შესახებ ინსტისტუალური რე მაგრამ, ამ რეფოსტორიების რაოდენობის გაფართლების სიმაღლე იყო გამოცდილობა, რომელიც ახალი დამატებული არქეტების შესახებ იგივე სიმაღლეში დამატებულია. ამ გამოცდილების გარეშე, ჩვენ ავტომატურად აღმოჩენოთ კონგრესის მისამართების ლიბური მისამართებით (LCSH) წიგნის შესაძლებლობა. ჩვენ პირველი გამოყენებთ საბოლო სკრიპების გასაღების სიტყვების კოლექციისთვის რეპოზიტორიის ანალიტიკის და მეტრიკის პორტალის (RAMP) სკრიქციისთვის. შემდეგ, ჩვენ ამ გასაღების სიტყვას LCSH-ის სახელებისთვის გავაკეთებთ მონაცემების სიტყვას. როგორც შესახებ, ბიოლოგიური LCSH კონფექტების სუბსეტის გამოყენება, ჩვენ განვითარებით პროგრამეტური მოდელების განვითარებით ამ რაოდენობის ფორმულაციას, როგორც ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები აჩვენებენ ამ პროგრამის ცხოვრებელობას, რომელიც LCSH-ს სწავლეულებისთვის წარმოდგენა.', 'it': 'Gli istituti sono tenuti a catalogare i loro articoli con intestazioni tematiche adeguate in modo che gli utenti possano facilmente recuperare gli articoli pertinenti dai repository istituzionali. Tuttavia, a causa del tasso di proliferazione del numero di articoli in questi repository, sta diventando una sfida catalogare manualmente gli articoli appena aggiunti allo stesso ritmo. Per affrontare questa sfida, esploriamo la fattibilità di annotare automaticamente gli articoli con Library of Congress Subject Headings (LCSH). Utilizziamo il web scraping per estrarre parole chiave per una raccolta di articoli dal portale RAMP (Repository Analytics and Metrics Portal). Quindi, mappiamo queste parole chiave ai nomi LCSH per sviluppare un set di dati gold-standard. Come caso di studio, utilizzando il sottoinsieme dei concetti LCSH correlati alla biologia, sviluppiamo modelli predittivi formulando questo compito come un problema di classificazione multi-etichetta. I nostri risultati sperimentali dimostrano la fattibilità di questo approccio per predire LCSH per articoli accademici.', 'kk': 'Институттар мақалаларын дұрыс мақалалармен каталогтау керек, сондықтан пайдаланушылар институттық репозиториялардан қатынасыз мақалаларды оңай алуға болады. Бірақ бұл репозиторилердегі мақалалар санын өзгерту жиілігінен бір жерде жаңа қосылған мақалаларды қолмен каталогтау шақыру болады. Бұл мәселелерді өзгерту үшін, конгресс тақырыбының (LCSH) кітапханасының мақалаларын автоматты түрде белгілеу мүмкіндігін зерттейміз. Біз біріншіден, сақтау аналитикалық және метрикалық порталынан (RAMP) мақалаларды жинақтау үшін кілттерді сөздерді тарқату үшін веб- жүгіртуді қолданамыз. Содан кейін оларды алтын стандартты деректер жиынын құру үшін LCSH атауларына картап береміз. Бұл тапсырманы бірнеше жарлық классификациялық мәселе ретінде, биологиялық LCSH концепцияларының субөлігін қолдану үшін, біз бұл тапсырманы бірнеше жарлық классификациял Біздің тәжірибелікті нәтижеміз LCSH бағдарламаларды бақылау үшін бұл тәжірибелікті көрсетеді.', 'hu': 'Az intézményeknek megfelelő tárgyfejezetekkel kell katalógusozniuk cikkeiket, hogy a felhasználók könnyen letölthessék a releváns cikkeket az intézményi adattárakból. Azonban az ezekben az adattárakban lévő cikkek számának elterjedése miatt kihívást jelent az újonnan hozzáadott cikkek manuális katalógusa ugyanabban a tempóban. Ennek a kihívásnak a megoldása érdekében megvizsgáljuk a cikkek automatikus jegyzetelésének megvalósíthatóságát a Kongresszusi Könyvtár Subject Headings (LCSH). Először a webes scraping segítségével kivonjuk a cikkek gyűjteményének kulcsszavait a Repository Analytics és Metrics Portálból (RAMP). Ezután ezeket a kulcsszavakat LCSH nevekhez térképezzük fel egy aranyszabású adatkészlet kidolgozásához. Esettanulmányként a Biológiai LCSH koncepciók alcsoportját felhasználva prediktív modelleket dolgozunk ki úgy, hogy ezt a feladatot többcímkés osztályozási problémaként fogalmazzuk meg. Kísérleti eredményeink bizonyítják ennek a megközelítésnek az életképességét a tudományos cikkek LCSH előrejelzésére.', 'el': 'Τα ιδρύματα υποχρεούνται να ταξινομούν τα άρθρα τους με κατάλληλες θεματικές επικεφαλίδες, έτσι ώστε οι χρήστες να μπορούν εύκολα να ανακτήσουν τα σχετικά άρθρα από τα θεσμικά αποθετήρια. Ωστόσο, λόγω του ρυθμού διάδοσης του αριθμού των άρθρων σε αυτά τα αποθετήρια, καθίσταται πρόκληση να ταξινομήσετε χειροκίνητα τα νέα άρθρα με τον ίδιο ρυθμό. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτή η πρόκληση, διερευνούμε τη δυνατότητα αυτόματης σχολιασμού άρθρων με επικεφαλίδες θεμάτων της Βιβλιοθήκης του Κογκρέσου. Χρησιμοποιούμε πρώτα την απόσπαση ιστοσελίδων για να εξάγουμε λέξεις-κλειδιά για μια συλλογή άρθρων από την πύλη ανάλυσης και μετρήσεων αποθετηρίου (RAMP). Στη συνέχεια, αντιστοιχίζουμε αυτές τις λέξεις-κλειδιά σε ονόματα για την ανάπτυξη ενός συνόλου δεδομένων χρυσού προτύπου. Ως μελέτη περίπτωσης, χρησιμοποιώντας το υποσύνολο των εννοιών που σχετίζονται με τη Βιολογία, αναπτύσσουμε προβλέψιμα μοντέλα διατυπώνοντας αυτό το έργο ως πρόβλημα ταξινόμησης πολλαπλών ετικετών. Τα πειραματικά μας αποτελέσματα καταδεικνύουν τη βιωσιμότητα αυτής της προσέγγισης για την πρόβλεψη για επιστημονικά άρθρα.', 'lt': 'Įstaigos privalo kataloguoti savo straipsnius tinkamais objektų pavadinimais, kad naudotojai galėtų lengvai gauti atitinkamus straipsnius iš institucinių duomenų saugyklų. Tačiau dėl šių saugyklose esančių gaminių skaičiaus plitimo sunku rankiniu būdu kataloguoti naujus gaminius tuo pačiu tempu. Siekdami išspręsti šį uždavinį, išnagrinėjame galimybę automatiškai annotuoti straipsnius su Kongreso bibliotekos dalykų antraštėmis (LCSH). Pirmiausia naudojame tinklo skraidymą, kad ištrauktume pagrindinius žodžius iš duomenų saugyklos analizės ir metrikos portalo (RAMP) gaminiams rinkti. Tuomet žemėlapizuojame šiuos raktinius žodžius LCSH pavadinimams, kad būtų sukurtas aukso standartinis duomenų rinkinys. As a case study, using the subset of Biology-related LCSH concepts, we develop predictive models by formulating this task as a multi-label classification problem.  Mūsų eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo šio metodo gyvybingumą prognozuojant mokslo straipsnių LCSH.', 'mk': 'Институтите се бараат да ги каталогираат своите статии со соодветни наслови на темата за корисниците лесно да можат да добијат релевантни статии од институционалните резервоари. Сепак, поради стапката на проширување на бројот на статии во овие складишта, станува предизвик рачно да се каталогираат новите статии во исто темпо. За да го решиме овој предизвик, ја истражуваме физибилитетот на автоматски анотирање на статиите со главите на библиотеката на субјектите на Конгресот (LCSH). Прво користиме бришење на веб за да извадиме клучни зборови за колекција на написи од порталот за репозиторија аналитичка и метрика (RAMP). Then, we map these keywords to LCSH names for developing a gold-standard dataset.  Како случајна студија, користејќи го подгрупата на концепти на БИОЛОгија поврзани со ЛЦШ, развиваме предвидливи модели со формулирање на оваа задача како проблем со мултиетикетата на класификацијата. Нашите експериментални резултати ја демонстрираат животноста на овој пристап за предвидување на LCSH за научни статии.', 'ml': 'സ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d എളുപ്പമായി വിലാസപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്. എന്നാലും ഈ റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടോറികളിലെ ലേഖനങ്ങളുടെ എണ്ണം കൂടുതല്\u200d വീണ്ടെടുക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, പുതിയ ലേഖനങ്ങള്\u200d കൈകാര്യം ചേര്\u200dത്തുകൊണ്ട് ഒരേ  ഈ വ്യാല്\u200dച്ചല്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വയം ലേഖനങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രസ്താവിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ സ്വയമായി പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം വെബ് സ്ക്രാപ്റ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നത് റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടിറിയില്\u200d നിന്നും മെറ്റിക്സ് പോര്\u200dട്ട്രിക്സില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒര പിന്നെ നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ കീവോര്\u200dഡുകള്\u200d LCSH നാമങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് മാപ്പ് ചെയ്യുന്നു. സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണസ്ഥാനമായ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ്  ബൈയോളജി ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട LCSH ആശയം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു കേസ് പഠനത്തിനായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ ജോലി ഒരു പല-ലേറ്റ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷഷന്\u200d പ്രശ്നമാക്കുന്ന നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന രേഖകള്\u200dക്കായി LCSH പ്രവചിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഈ നടപടിയുടെ വിശ്', 'ms': 'Institusi diperlukan untuk katalog artikel mereka dengan pengepala subjek yang betul supaya pengguna boleh dengan mudah mendapatkan artikel yang berkaitan dari repositori institusi. Namun, disebabkan kadar penjelasan bilangan artikel dalam repositori ini, ia menjadi cabaran untuk mengkatalog secara manual artikel baru ditambah dengan kadar yang sama. Untuk mengatasi cabaran ini, kami mengeksplorasi kemungkinan untuk anotasi artikel secara automatik dengan Pustaka Subjek Kongres (LCSH). Pertama-tama, kami gunakan penyakaran web untuk mengekstrak kata kunci untuk koleksi artikel dari Portal Analisis dan Metriks Repositori (RAMP). Kemudian, kita petakan kata kunci ini kepada nama LCSH untuk mengembangkan set data piawai emas. Sebagai kajian kes, menggunakan subset konsep LCSH berkaitan dengan Biologi, kami mengembangkan model ramalan dengan membentuk tugas ini sebagai masalah klasifikasi multi-label. Hasil percubaan kami menunjukkan kemampuan pendekatan ini untuk meramalkan LCSH untuk artikel ilmiah.', 'mt': 'L-istituzzjonijiet huma meħtieġa jikkatalgaw l-oġġetti tagħhom b’intestaturi tas-suġġetti xierqa sabiex l-utenti jkunu jistgħu faċilment jiksbu l-oġġetti rilevanti mir-repożitorji istituzzjonali. Madankollu, minħabba r-rata ta’ proliferazzjoni tan-numru ta’ oġġetti f’dawn ir-repożitorji, qed issir sfida biex l-oġġetti ġodda miżjuda jiġu kkategolati manwalment bl-istess ritmu. Biex nindirizzaw din l-isfida, aħna nesploraw il-fattibbiltà li jiġu annotati awtomatikament l-artikoli bl-Intestaturi tas-Suġġetti tal-Librerija tal-Kungress (LCSH). L-ewwel a ħna nużaw l-iskrabar fuq l-internet biex neħħew kliem ewlieni għal ġabra ta’ oġġetti mill-Portal tal-Analiżi u l-Metriki tar-Repożitorju (RAMP). Then, we map these keywords to LCSH names for developing a gold-standard dataset.  Bħala studju ta’ każ, bl-użu tas-sottosett ta’ kunċetti LCSH relatati mal-Bijoloġija, a ħna niżviluppaw mudelli ta’ tbassir billi nifformulaw dan il-kompitu bħala problem a ta’ klassifikazzjoni b’ħafna tikketti. Ir-riżultati sperimentali tagħna juru l-vijabbiltà ta’ dan l-approċċ għat-tbassir tal-LCSH għal oġġetti xjentifiċi.', 'mn': 'Институтууд бүтээгдэхүүнийг зөв сэдвийн удирдлагаар каталог хийх шаардлагатай. Иймээс хэрэглэгчид байгууллагын хадгалагдсан баримтуудыг амархан авах боломжтой. Гэвч эдгээр загваруудын тоо баримтууд нэмэгдсэн хэмжээний үр дүнд, шинэ нэмэгдсэн баримтуудыг гараараа адилхан хурдаар каталог хийх шаардлага болж байна. Энэ сорилтыг удирдахын тулд бид Конгресс сэдвийн удирдагчдын номын сан (LCSH) дээр автоматжуулах магадлалыг судлах боломжтой. Эхлээд бид Веб сүркингийг ашиглаж Repository Analytics, Metrics Portal (RAMP) болон хамгийн чухал үгийг цуглуулахад ашиглаж байна. Тэгээд бид эдгээр түлхүүр үгийг алт стандарт өгөгдлийн сан боловсруулахын тулд LCSH нэртэй газрын зураг зурж байна. Биологийн холбоотой LCSH ойлголтыг ашиглан бид үүнийг олон загварын хуваалтын асуудал гэж тодорхойлоход таамаглалтын загваруудыг хөгжүүлдэг. Бидний туршилтын үр дүн нь LCSH-г судалгааны баримтуудад таамаглах боломжтой байдлыг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'Instytuty są zobowiązane do katalogowania swoich artykułów z odpowiednimi nagłówkami tematycznymi, aby użytkownicy mogli łatwo pobrać odpowiednie artykuły z repozytoriów instytucjonalnych. Jednak ze względu na tempo rozprzestrzeniania się liczby artykułów w tych repozytoriach, wyzwaniem staje się ręczne katalogowanie nowo dodanych artykułów w tym samym tempie. Aby sprostać temu wyzwaniu, badamy możliwość automatycznego adnotacji artykułów za pomocą nagłówek Biblioteki Kongresu (LCSH). Najpierw wykorzystujemy web scraping do wyodrębnienia słów kluczowych dla zbioru artykułów z Repository Analytics and Metrics Portal (RAMP). Następnie mapujemy te słowa kluczowe do nazw LCSH w celu opracowania złotego standardu zbioru danych. Jako studium przypadku, wykorzystując podzbiór koncepcji LCSH związanych z biologią, opracowujemy modele predykcyjne formułując to zadanie jako problem klasyfikacji wieloznakowych. Nasze wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują możliwość tego podejścia do przewidywania LCSH dla artykułów naukowych.', 'no': 'Institusjonane er nødvendig for å katalogera artiklara sine med rette emnesekstar slik at brukarane kan lett henta relevant artiklar frå institusjonelle lageret. Men på grunn av utvidinga av talet på artiklar i desse lageret blir det ein utfordring å katalogera dei nye lagte artiklara manuelt på same plass. For å handtera denne utfordringen, så utforskar vi at det er mogleg å automatisk oppmerke artikler med biblioteket av kongress emneseldar (LCSH). Vi bruker først nettskraping for å pakka ut nøkkelord for eit samling av artiklar frå laganalytikken og metriske portal (RAMP). Så karterer vi desse nøkkelordene til LCSH-namn for å utvikla eit gull-standard dataset. Som ein tilfeldige studie, ved å bruka subdelen av LCSH-konseptar med biologikk, utviklar vi forebyggingsmodeller ved å formulere denne oppgåva som eit multimerkelapplasseringsproblem. Eksperimentale resultatet våre viser at denne tilnærminga kan gjerast for å foregå LCSH for forskjellige artiklar.', 'ro': 'Institutele sunt obligate să-și catalogeze articolele cu titluri de subiect corespunzătoare, astfel încât utilizatorii să poată recupera cu ușurință articolele relevante din depozitele instituționale. Cu toate acestea, datorită ratei de proliferare a numărului de articole din aceste depozite, devine o provocare catalogarea manuală a articolelor nou adăugate în același ritm. Pentru a aborda această provocare, explorăm fezabilitatea adnotării automate a articolelor cu titluri de subiect ale Bibliotecii Congresului (LCSH). Folosim mai întâi web scraping pentru a extrage cuvinte cheie pentru o colecție de articole din Portalul Repository Analytics și Metrics (RAMP). Apoi, vom mapa aceste cuvinte cheie la numele LCSH pentru dezvoltarea unui set de date gold-standard. Ca studiu de caz, folosind subsetul conceptelor LCSH legate de biologie, dezvoltăm modele predictive prin formularea acestei sarcini ca o problemă de clasificare multi-etichetă. Rezultatele noastre experimentale demonstrează viabilitatea acestei abordări pentru predicția LCSH pentru articole științifice.', 'sr': 'Institucije su potrebne za katalizaciju svojih članaka sa odgovarajućim poglavljama teme tako da korisnici mogu lako dobiti relevantne članake iz institucionalnih repozitorija. Međutim, zbog brzine proširenja broja članaka u ovim skladištima postaje izazov da se ručno katalizuje novi dodani članak u istom tempou. Za rješavanje ovog izazova, istražujemo mogućnost automatske annotacije članaka sa knjižnicom predmetnih predmeta Kongresa (LCSH). Prvo koristimo web skraping da izvučemo ključne reči za kolekciju članaka iz analitike i metrika Portal a (RAMP). Onda mapiramo ove ključne reči na LCSH imena za razvoj zlatnog standardnog seta podataka. Kao studija slučajeva, koristeći podskup koncepta LCSH povezanih sa biologijom, razvijamo predvidne modele formiranjem ovog zadatka kao problem sa klasifikacijom multietiketa. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju životljivost ovog pristupa za predviđanje LCSH za naučne članke.', 'so': 'Iskuulaadka waxaa loo baahan yahay in lagu baaraandejiyo warqadahooda warqadaha saxda ah, si isticmaalayaashu ay si fudud uga soo qaadan karaan warqadaha muhiimka ah oo laga soo celin karo warqadaha cusub. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, sababtoo ah tirada warqadaha lagu kordhiyo warqadahan waxay u noqon kartaa dhibaato in ay si rasmi ah u soo bandhigto warqadaha cusub oo la soo daro isla mar. Si aan ula macaamiloono dhibaatadan, waxaynu baaraynaa suurtagalka ay automatic u baaraandegaan warqadaha maktabada madaxda Congress (LCSH). Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu isticmaalnaa internetka baaraandegista si aan uga soo bixino erayada furayaasha oo laga soo ururiyo warqadaha lagu qoray baaritaanka iyo bandhigyada (RAMP). Markaas waxaynu karnaa erayadan furan oo u qoraynaa magacyada LCSH si aan u korinno sawirada ah oo dahab-standard. Sida waxbarashada xaalada ah, waxaynu u horumarinnaa qaabab la sii sheegayo oo ku qorayo arimahan sida dhibaato kala duduwan oo kale. Abaalkayaga jirrabka ah waxay muujiyaan awoodda qaababkan ka horumarinta qoraalka barashada ee LCSH.', 'si': 'සංස්ථානය අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා ඔවුන්ගේ පිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපි නමුත්, මේ තොරතුරු වලින් පිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළ මේ අභ්\u200dයානය විධානය කරන්න, අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂය (LCSH) ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති අපි මුලින්ම වෙබ් ස්ක්\u200dරිප් එක භාවිතා කරනවා මෙට්\u200dරික් පොර්ටාල (RAMP) වලින් ලේඛන සංග්රහයක් සඳහා යතුරු වචන සංග් ඊට පස්සේ, අපි මේ යතුරු වචන වචනය LCSH නම් වලට සුන්ද්\u200dරව්\u200dය දත්ත සැට විකාශ කරනවා. ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට, ජීවිත්\u200dයාත්මක සම්බන්ධ LCSH ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් භාවිත කරනවා, අපි මේ වැඩේ විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට ප අපේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ මේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් LCSH විශ්වාසිකව', 'sv': 'Instituten är skyldiga att katalogisera sina artiklar med lämpliga ämnesrubriker så att användarna enkelt kan hämta relevanta artiklar från institutionernas arkiv. Men på grund av spridningen av antalet artiklar i dessa arkiv blir det en utmaning att manuellt katalogisera de nyligen tillagda artiklarna i samma takt. För att möta denna utmaning undersöker vi möjligheten att automatiskt kommentera artiklar med Library of Congress Subject Headings (LCSH). Vi använder först webbskrapning för att extrahera nyckelord för en samling artiklar från Repository Analytics and Metrics Portal (RAMP). Sedan kartlägger vi dessa nyckelord till LCSH-namn för att utveckla en guldstandard dataset. Som en fallstudie, med hjälp av deluppsättningen Biology-relaterade LCSH koncept, utvecklar vi prediktiva modeller genom att formulera denna uppgift som ett multi-label klassificeringsproblem. Våra experimentella resultat visar att denna metod är genomförbar för att förutsäga LCSH för vetenskapliga artiklar.', 'ta': 'நிறுவனங்கள் தங்கள் கட்டுரைகளை சரியான பொருள் தலைப்புகளுடன் பட்டியலிட வேண்டும். அதனால் பயனர்கள் நிறுவனம் கிடங்குகளிலிருந்து சுலபமா However, due to the rate of proliferation of the number of articles in these repositories, it is becoming a challenge to manually catalog the newly added articles at the same pace.  இந்த சவாலை முகவரிப்பதற்கு, காங்கிரஸ் பொருள் தலைப்புகளுடன் தானாகவே கட்டுரைகளை வெளிப்படுத்தும் தன்னியக்கமாக தெரியும். @ info பின்னர், நாம் இந்த விசையார்த்தைகளை LCSH பெயர்களில் வரைபடம் செய்கிறோம் ஒரு தங்கக்கூடிய தரவு அமைப்பு. ஒரு விஷயத்தின் படிப்பாடு, பையோology-related LCSH கருத்துக்களை பயன்படுத்தி, நாம் இந்த செயலை பல- label வகுப்பு பிரச்சினையாக உருவாக்குவதற்கான முன்வாக எங்கள் சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் கல்வி கட்டுரைகளுக்கு LCSH முன்வெளிப்படுத்துவதற்கான இந்த செயல்பாட்டின் வாழ்க்', 'ur': 'انٹیسٹوں کو اپنا لکھنا ضرورت ہے کہ ان کے لکھوں کو اچھی سرگوشی کے ساتھ کاٹولگ کریں تاکہ کارساز آسانی طرح معاملہ لکھانے کے لئے لائق لکھ سکیں۔ However, due to the proliferation of articles in these repositories, it is a challenge to manually catalog the newly added articles at the same pace. اس چال کے بارے میں، ہم نے کانگرس سرگوشیوں (LCSH) کے لائبرہ کے سرگوشیوں (لائبرہ) کے ذریعے سرگوشیوں (لائبرہ) کے ذریعے سرگوشیوں کو اپنا نامہ دکھانے کے قابل تحقیق کی۔ ہم پہلی بار ویب اسکراپینگ کا استعمال کریں گے کہ ریپزٹری آنلیٹیکس اور متریک پورتل (RAMP) سے لکھنے کے لئے کلیدورڈ استعمال کریں۔ پھر ہم ان کلیدورڈوں کو LCSH ناموں میں نقشه بناتے ہیں ایک سوند-استاندارڈیٹ سٹ کو ایجاد کرنے کے لئے۔ ایک کیس مطالعہ کے طور پر، زیولوژیکی رابطہ دار LCSH نظریں کے سپسٹ کے استعمال سے، ہم اس کام کو multi-label classification مشکل کے طور پر فرمول کر رہے ہیں، پیش بینی موڈل کو ایجاد کرتے ہیں. ہمارے آزمائش نتیجے اس طریقے کی زندگی کا ثابت قدم دکھاتے ہیں کہ LCSH کو علمی مقررہ کے لئے پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے۔', 'uz': "@ info Lekin, bu raqamli maqolalarning soni soni chegarasi sababi, yangi qoʻlbola qoʻlbola qoʻlbola qoʻlbola qoʻllash maqolalarni bir darajada katak qilish qiymati mumkin. Bu muammolani talab qilish uchun biz kongress mavzu sarlavhasi kutubxona bilan avtomatik maqolalarni qidirish imkoniyatini aniqlamiz. Birinchi foydalanuvchi, Repository Analytika va Metrik portal (RAMP) maqolalarni birlashtirish uchun foydalanamiz. Keyin, biz bu tugmalar birikmasini LCSH nomlariga qarasamiz. As a case study, using the subset of Biology-related LCSH concepts, we develop predictive models by formulating this task as a multi-label classification problem.  Bizning tajriba natijalarimiz o'qituvchi maqolalar uchun LCSH ta'minlovchi imkoniyatini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Các bộ phận nội bộ buộc phải liệt kê các bài báo của họ bằng các đề mục thích hợp để người dùng có thể dễ dàng lấy các bài báo liên quan từ các kho lưu trữ nội bộ. Tuy nhiên, vì tỷ lệ phát triển số lượng đồ dùng trong các kho lưu trữ, việc liệt kê các công cụ mới vào cùng nhịp độ đang trở nên khó khăn. Để giải quyết thử thách này, chúng tôi khám phá khả năng tự động ghi chú các bài báo với Thư viện đối tượng Quốc hội (LCsh). Đầu tiên, chúng tôi dùng cạo web để trích ra từ khoá cho một bộ sưu tập các tác phẩm từ Thủ Phủ Analytic and Metrics Portal (RAMP). Sau đó, chúng tôi lập bản đồ các từ khoá để có thể phát triển một bộ dữ liệu mẫu vàng. Để nghiên cứu các trường hợp, sử dụng bộ dạng mô-tô sinh học liên quan đến các khái niệm LCS, chúng tôi phát triển các mô hình dự đoán bằng cách phát triển nhiệm vụ này như một vấn đề phân loại đa nhãn. Các kết quả thử nghiệm của chúng tôi chứng minh khả năng dự đoán LCS cho các bài báo khoa học.', 'da': 'Institutterne er forpligtet til at katalogisere deres artikler med passende emneoverskrifter, så brugerne nemt kan hente relevante artikler fra de institutionelle lagre. På grund af antallet af artikler i disse arkiver er det imidlertid ved at blive en udfordring at manuelt katalogisere de nyligt tilføjede artikler i samme tempo. For at løse denne udfordring undersøger vi muligheden for automatisk at annotere artikler med Library of Congress Subject Headings (LCSH). Vi bruger først web scraping til at udtrække nøgleord til en samling artikler fra Repository Analytics and Metrics Portal (RAMP). Derefter kortlægger vi disse søgeord til LCSH navne for at udvikle et guldstandard datasæt. Som et casestudie, ved hjælp af undersættelsen af Biologi-relaterede LCSH koncepter, udvikler vi prædiktive modeller ved at formulere denne opgave som et multi-label klassifikationsproblem. Vores eksperimentelle resultater viser levedygtigheden af denne tilgang til at forudsige LCSH for videnskabelige artikler.', 'hr': 'Institucije su potrebne za katalizaciju svojih članaka s odgovarajućim podacima teme kako bi korisnici lako mogli dobiti relevantne članake iz institucionalnih skladišta. Međutim, zbog stope proširenja broja članaka u ovim skladištima postaje izazov da se ručno katalizira novi dodani članak u istom tempou. Za rješavanje ovog izazova istražujemo mogućnost automatskog annotacije članaka sa knjižnicom predsjednika Kongresa (LCSH). Prvo koristimo web skraping kako bi izvukli ključne riječi za skupljanje članaka iz analitike i metrika Portal a (RAMP). Onda mapiramo ove ključne riječi na LCSH imena za razvoj zlatnih standardnih podataka. Kao istraživanje slučajeva, koristeći podskup koncepta LCSH povezanih s biologijom, razvijamo predvidne modele formuliranjem ovog zadatka kao problem sa klasifikacijom višeetičkih etiketa. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju životljivost ovog pristupa za predviđanje LCSH za učenjene članke.', 'bg': 'Институтите са длъжни да каталогизират своите статии с подходящи заглавия на темата, така че потребителите да могат лесно да извличат съответните статии от институционалните регистри. Въпреки това, поради скоростта на разпространение на броя на статиите в тези хранилища, се превръща в предизвикателство ръчното каталогизиране на новодобавените статии със същото темпо. За да се справим с това предизвикателство, изследваме възможността за автоматично анотиране на статии с тематични заглавия на библиотеката на конгреса. Първо използваме уеб изстъргване, за да извлечем ключови думи за колекция от статии от портала за анализ и измерване на хранилището (РАМП). След това картографираме тези ключови думи с имена за разработване на златен стандарт набор от данни. Като казус, използвайки поднабора от концепции, свързани с биологията, разработваме прогнозни модели, като формулираме тази задача като многоетикетен проблем за класификация. Нашите експериментални резултати демонстрират жизнеспособността на този подход за прогнозиране на ЛКШ за научни статии.', 'nl': 'Instituten zijn verplicht om hun artikelen te catalogiseren met de juiste onderwerpen, zodat de gebruikers gemakkelijk relevante artikelen uit de institutionele repositories kunnen ophalen. Vanwege de snelheid van proliferatie van het aantal artikelen in deze repositories wordt het echter een uitdaging om de nieuw toegevoegde artikelen handmatig in hetzelfde tempo te catalogiseren. Om deze uitdaging aan te pakken, onderzoeken we de haalbaarheid van het automatisch annoteren van artikelen met Library of Congress Subject Headings (LCSH). We gebruiken eerst web scraping om trefwoorden voor een verzameling artikelen uit de Repository Analytics and Metrics Portal (RAMP) te extraheren. Vervolgens brengen we deze trefwoorden in kaart aan LCSH-namen voor het ontwikkelen van een goudstandaard dataset. Als casestudy, gebruikmakend van de subset van Biologie-gerelateerde LCSH concepten, ontwikkelen we voorspellende modellen door deze taak te formuleren als een multi-label classificatieprobleem. Onze experimentele resultaten tonen de haalbaarheid aan van deze benadering voor het voorspellen van LCSH voor wetenschappelijke artikelen.', 'de': 'Institute sind verpflichtet, ihre Artikel mit entsprechenden Überschriften zu katalogisieren, damit die Nutzer relevante Artikel aus den institutionellen Repositorien leicht abrufen können. Aufgrund der Proliferation der Anzahl der Artikel in diesen Repositories wird es jedoch zu einer Herausforderung, die neu hinzugefügten Artikel im gleichen Tempo manuell zu katalogisieren. Um dieser Herausforderung gerecht zu werden, untersuchen wir die Machbarkeit, Artikel automatisch mit Library of Congress Subject Headings (LCSH) zu kommentieren. Zunächst verwenden wir Web Scraping, um Keywords für eine Artikelsammlung aus dem Repository Analytics and Metrics Portal (RAMP) zu extrahieren. Anschließend ordnen wir diese Keywords LCSH-Namen zu, um einen Goldstandard-Datensatz zu entwickeln. Als Fallstudie entwickeln wir anhand der Teilmenge von Biologie-bezogenen LCSH-Konzepten prädiktive Modelle, indem wir diese Aufgabe als Multi-Label-Klassifikationsproblem formulieren. Unsere experimentellen Ergebnisse belegen die Machbarkeit dieses Ansatzes zur Vorhersage von LCSH für wissenschaftliche Artikel.', 'id': 'Institutes are required to catalog their articles with proper subject headings so that the users can easily retrieve relevant articles from the institutional repositories.  Namun, karena tingkat proliferasi dari jumlah artikel di repositori ini, itu menjadi tantangan untuk secara manual mengkatalogkan artikel baru ditambah dengan tingkat yang sama. Untuk mengatasi tantangan ini, kami mengeksplorasi feasibilitas dari otomatis annotasi artikel dengan Pustaka Subjek Kongres (LCSH). Kami pertama-tama menggunakan menggaruk web untuk mengekstrak kata kunci untuk koleksi artikel dari Repository Analytics and Metrics Portal (RAMP). Lalu, kita petakan kata kunci ini ke nama LCSH untuk mengembangkan set data standar emas. Sebagai studi kasus, menggunakan subset konsep LCSH yang berhubungan dengan Biologi, kami mengembangkan model prediksif dengan menyiformulasi tugas ini sebagai masalah klasifikasi multi-label. Hasil percobaan kami menunjukkan kemampuan pendekatan ini untuk memprediksi LCSH untuk artikel ilmiah.', 'fa': 'موسسه\u200cها نیاز دارند تا مقاله\u200cهایشان را با عنوان موضوع مناسب کاتالوژ کنند تا کاربران به راحتی مقاله\u200cهای مربوط به استفاده از محفوظه\u200cهای موسسه\u200cها بردارند. با این حال، به دلیل افزایش سرعت تعداد مقاله\u200cها در این محفوظه\u200cها، آن یک چالش می\u200cشود که به دستی مقاله\u200cهای اضافه\u200cشده جدید در یک سرعت کاتالوژ کند. برای حل کردن این چالش، ما به طور خودکار موضوع آگاهی کردن مجموعه\u200cها با کتابخانه\u200cی عنوان\u200cهای کنگره (LCSH) تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. ما اولین بار از گسترش وب استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا کلمات کلید برای مجموعه\u200cای از مجموعه\u200cهای تحلیل\u200cکننده\u200cها و پورتل متریک (RAMP) استفاده کنیم. سپس ما این کلمات کلید را به نام LCSH نقشه می\u200cکنیم برای توسعه مجموعه داده\u200cهای طلا استاندارد. به عنوان یک مطالعه پرونده، با استفاده از زیر بخش مطالعه های LCSH رابطه به زیست زیست شناسی، ما مدل پیش بینی را توسعه می کنیم با فرمول این کار به عنوان یک مشکل تجزیه کردن مشکل چندین برچسب. نتیجه آزمایشی ما قابلیت این روش را برای پیش بینی LCSH برای مقاله های علمی نشان می دهد.', 'ko': '각 연구소는 기구 지식 라이브러리에서 관련 글을 쉽게 검색할 수 있도록 적당한 주제 제목으로 문장을 분류할 것을 요구받고 있다.그러나 이들 저장소의 글 수가 급증하면서 새로 추가된 글의 목록을 같은 속도로 수동으로 작성하는 것은 도전이다.이 도전에 대응하기 위해 국회도서관 주제제목(LCSH)으로 문장을 자동으로 주석하는 타당성을 모색했다.먼저 Repository Analytics and Metrics Portal(RAMP)에서 다양한 기사를 추출한 키워드를 웹에서 캡처합니다.그런 다음 LCSH 이름에 이러한 키워드를 매핑하여 표준 데이터 세트를 개발합니다.사례 연구로서 우리는 생물학과 관련된 LCSH 개념 서브집합을 사용하여 이 임무를 다중 라벨 분류 문제로 묘사함으로써 예측 모델을 개발했다.우리의 실험 결과는 이런 방법이 학술 문장의 LCSH를 예측하는 데 타당성을 증명하였다.', 'sw': 'Taasisi zinahitajika kuweka makala zao kwa vichwa vya habari sahihi ili watumiaji waweze kupata makala muhimu kutoka kwenye vituo vya taasisi. Hata hivyo, kwa sababu ya kuongezeka kwa kiwango cha idadi ya makala katika makala hizi, inakuwa ni changamoto ya kuchapisha makala mpya zilizoongezwa kwa manufaa katika hatua hiyo. Ili kukabiliana na changamoto hili, tunagundua uwezekano wa kuweka makala zinazoelezea vibaya na Maktaba ya Maudhui ya Congress (LCSH). Kwa mara ya kwanza tunatumia kuratibu mtandaoni ili kutengeneza maneno ya ufunguo kwa ajili ya mkusanyiko wa makala kutoka kwenye Uchambuzi wa Uchambuzi na Utafiti (RAMP). Kisha, tunaramani maneno haya ya ufunguo kwa majina ya LCSH kwa ajili ya kutengeneza seti ya taarifa za dhahabu. Kama utafiti wa kesi, kwa kutumia kandanda ya dhana za LCSH zinazohusiana na Biolojy, tunaendelea mifano ya kutabiri kwa kutengeneza kazi hii kama tatizo la kutangaza vifaa vingi. Matokeo yetu ya majaribio yanaonyesha uwezekano wa namna hii ya kutabiri LCSH kwa makala za kisomi.', 'af': "Institute word benodig om hul artikels te katalogeer met regte onderwerp koppelinge sodat die gebruikers maklik relevant artikels van die institusiele stoorplekke kan ontvang. Maar, vanweë die tempo van uitbreiding van die aantal artikels in hierdie stoorplekke, word dit 'n uitdrukking geword om die nuwe byvoeg artikels in die selfde tempo te katalogeer. Om hierdie uitdrukking te raak, ondersoek ons die feilikheid van outomaties opmerking van artikels met biblioteek van Kongres onderwerp opskrifte (LCSH). Ons gebruik eerste web skraping om sleutelwoorde vir 'n versameling van artikels uit die Stoorplek Analytics en Metrike Portal (RAMP) uit te pak. Dan kaart ons hierdie sleutelwoorde na LCSH-naams vir 'n goud-standaard datastel te ontwikkel. As 'n geval studie, gebruik die subartikel van biologie-verwante LCSH-konsepte, ontwikkel ons voorskou modele deur hierdie taak as 'n multi-label klasifikasie probleem te formuleer. Ons eksperimentale resultate vertoon die lewendigheid van hierdie toegang vir die voorskou van LCSH vir wetenskaplike artikels.", 'sq': 'Institutet janë të kërkuar të katalogojnë artikujt e tyre me titujt e duhur të subjektit në mënyrë që përdoruesit të mund lehtë të marrin artikujt e duhura nga depozitat institucionale. Megjithatë, për shkak të nivelit të shpërndarjes së numrit të artikujve në këto depozita, ajo po bëhet një sfidë për të kataloguar manualisht artikujt e sapo shtuar në të njëjtën ritëm. Për të trajtuar këtë sfidë, ne eksplorojmë realizueshmërinë e anotimit automatik të artikujve me Bibliotekën e Subjekteve të Kongresit (LCSH). We first use web scraping to extract keywords for a collection of articles from the Repository Analytics and Metrics Portal (RAMP).  Pastaj, i hartojmë këto fjalë kyçe emrave LCSH për zhvillimin e një grupi të dhënash të standartit të arit. Si një studim rasti, duke përdorur nëngrupin e koncepteve LCSH lidhur me biologjinë, ne zhvillojmë modele parashikuese duke formuluar këtë detyrë si një problem klasifikimi me shumë etiketa. Rezultatet tona eksperimentale demonstrojnë jetueshmërinë e kësaj qasje për parashikimin e LCSH për artikujt shkencorë.', 'tr': 'Gurhanlar maýlaryny dogry tema başlygy bilen kataloglamak üçin gerek bolýar, oňa Ullançylar gural depolardan möhüm makalary ýeňil almak üçin ýeňil almaly bolýarlar. Ýöne, bu depelerde näçe maýllaryň azalyşygy sebäbi, täze bir maýllary elimden bir ýerde kataloglaşdyrmak kynçylyk bolýar. Biz bu kynçylyga çözmek üçin Kongre Resmi Başlykları (LCSH) kitaphanesi ile otomatik duýdurmanyň mümkinçiligini çözeriz. Biz ilkinji gezek gaýd sözleri Repository Analytics we Metrics Portal (RAMP) nyşanlarynyň bir ýygnak üçin a çmak üçin web ýüklemegini ulanýarys. Sonra bu a ç sözleri altyn standart veri setirini geliştirmek üçin LCSH adlaryna görkez. Bir ýagdaý çykyş bolsa, biologiýaly ýaly LCSH düşüncelerini ulanyp bu zady multi-label klasifikasy meselesi hökmünde öngörümli nusgalary döredip gelişýäris Biziň experimental netijelerimiz LCSH bilim makalary üçin öňünden geçirmek üçin bu ýagdaýyň döredijiligini görkezýär.', 'am': 'Institutes are required to catalog their articles with proper subject headings so that the users can easily retrieve relevant articles from the institutional repositories.  ምንም እንኳን፣ እነዚህን ሰብአቶች ቁጥር በቁጥጥር በቁጥጥር ምክንያት አዲስ ደብዳቤዎችን በአንድ ክፍል በመጠቀም አዲስ ደብዳቤዎችን በመጠቀም መግለጫ ሆነዋል፡፡ ይህንን ጥያቄ ለመቀበል፣ የኮንበር ጉዳዩ አካባቢ አናት (LCSH) ጽሑፎችን በአስማማማዊ መግለጫ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በመጀመሪያ የክልፎች ቃላትን ለመውጣት ከሪፖሬት Analytics እና ማትሪክ ፖርቲካ (RAMP) ለክልፍሎች አካላትን ለማውጣት ተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ የዚያን ጊዜም እነዚህን ቃሎች ለLCSH ስም የወርቅ-standard ዳታተር ለመፍጠር እናሳክራለን፡፡ የፍቺው ትምህርት፣ የቢዮሎጂ የLCSH ጉዳይ ጉዳይ በመጠቀም፣ ይህንን ሥራ በብዙ-label መለያየት ጉዳይ በመፍጠር እናሳድጋለን፡፡ ፈተና ፍሬዎቻችን ለትምህርት ትምህርት ጽሑፎችን ለመቀበል የዚህን ሥርዓት ማቀናቀል የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'hy': "Ինստիտուտները պարտադիր են կատալոգի իրենց հոդվածները ճիշտ թեմային գլխարկներով, որպեսզի օգտագործողները հեշտությամբ կարողանան վերցնել նշանակալի հոդվածներ ինստիտուցիոնալ պահեստանների Այնուամենայնիվ, այս արձանագրությունների թվի տարածման արագության պատճառով, այն դառնում է մարտահրավեր ձեռքով կատալոգել նոր արձանագրությունները նույն արագությամբ: Այս մարտահրավերի լուծման համար մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե արդյոք կարող ենք ինքնաբերաբար գրել հոդվածներ Կոնգրեսի թեմայի գրադարանի (LCSH) գլխավորներով: Առաջին անգամ մենք օգտագործում ենք վեբ-գրաֆիա գլխավոր բառերը բառերի հավաքածու համար RAMP-ից: Հետո մենք քարտեզագրում ենք այս բառերը LCSH անունների համար, որպեսզի զարգացնենք ոսկու ստանդարտ տվյալներ: Որպես դեպքի ուսումնասիրություն, օգտագործելով կենսաբանությամբ կապված LCSH-ի գաղափարների ենթախումբը, մենք զարգանում ենք կանխատեսողական մոդելներ' ձևավորելով այս խնդիրը որպես բազմապիտակ դասակարգման խնդիր: Մեր փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս այս մոտեցումը LCSH կանխատեսելու համար գիտական հոդվածների համար:", 'az': "İstifadəçilər mövcud məlumatlarını düzgün məlumat başlıqları ilə kataloq etmək üçün istifadəçilər mövcud məlumatları institucional depolardan asanlıqla almaq üçün lazımdır. Ancaq, bu depolarda məktub sayısının genişlənməsi səbəbi, yeni əlavə edilmiş məktubləri eyni dəfə kataloq etmək üçün çətin olunur. Bu çətinlikdən çəkinmək üçün, Kongres məsələlərinin (LCSH) bibliotekası ilə məktubları avtomatik olaraq bildirmək mümkünlüyünü keşfetirik. Biz ilk dəfə Depozitəçi Analytics və Metrics Portal (RAMP) tərəfindən anahtar sözləri çəkmək üçün web scraping kullanırıq. Sonra bu anahtar sözləri altın-standart veri qutusu təhsil etmək üçün LCSH adlarına xəritə gətiririk. Bu işi çoxlu etiketli klasifikasyon problemi olaraq formülə edərək, bioloji ilə əlaqəli LCSH nəfslərinin subgruplarını istifadə edərək öndəmli modelləri təmizləyirik. Bizim təcrübəmiz sonuçlarımız LCSH'nin elm maddələri üçün təcrübə etmək üçün bu təcrübənin yaşamlığını göstərir.", 'bn': 'প্রতিষ্ঠানগুলোকে সঠিক বিষয়ের শিরোনাম দিয়ে তাদের প্রতিবেদন প্রয়োজন যাতে ব্যবহারকারীরা স্থানীয় প্রতিষ্ঠান থেকে সংশ্লিষ্ তবে এই প্রতিবেদনের সংখ্যার সংখ্যা বৃদ্ধির কারণে এই প্রতিবেদনে নতুন প্রবন্ধগুলোকে একই গতিতে প্রকাশ করার জন্য এটি একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ হয়ে যাচ্ছে। এই চ্যালেঞ্জের কথা বলার জন্য আমরা স্বয়ংক্রেস অফ কংগ্রেস বিষয় শিরোনামের লেব্রেরীর মাধ্যমে প্রবন্ধগুলোকে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভ আমরা প্রথম ওয়েব স্ক্র্যাপিং ব্যবহার করি রিপোর্টরি বিশ্লেষণ এবং মেট্রিক পোর্টাল (RAMP) থেকে একটি প্রবন্ধ সংগ্রহের জন্য কী শব্দ তারপর, আমরা এলসিএসএইচ-এর নামের মানচিত্র মানচিত্রে সোনার-স্ট্যান্ডার্ড ড ডাটাসেট উন্নয়নের জন্য। একটি কেস গবেষণা হিসেবে বায়োলজি সংক্রান্ত LCSH ধারণা ব্যবহার করে আমরা এই কাজের মাধ্যমে বহুল লেবেল ক্লাসাফিকেশন সমস্যা হিসেবে গঠন করি ভবিষ্ আমাদের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল শিক্ষার্থীদের প্রবন্ধের জন্য এলসিএসএইচকে প্রত্যাখ্যান করার ব্যাপারটি প্রদর্শন করে।', 'bs': 'Institucije su potrebne za katalizaciju svojih članaka sa odgovarajućim predmetima kako bi korisnici lako mogli dobiti relevantne članake iz institucionalnih repozitorija. Međutim, zbog stope proširenja broja članaka u ovim skladištima postaje izazov da se ručno katalizira novi dodani članak u istom tempou. Za rješavanje ovog izazova, istražujemo mogućnost automatske annotacije članaka sa knjižnicom predsjednika Kongresa (LCSH). Prvo koristimo web skraping da izvučemo ključne riječi za kolekciju članaka iz skladišta analitike i metrika Portal a (RAMP). Onda mapiramo ove ključne riječi na LCSH imena za razvoj zlatnih standardnih podataka. Kao studija slučajeva, koristeći podskup koncepta LCSH povezanih s biologijom, razvijamo predvidne modele formiranjem ovog zadatka kao problem sa klasifikacijom multietiketa. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju životljivost ovog pristupa za predviđanje LCSH za naučne članke.', 'et': 'Instituudid on kohustatud kataloogima oma artiklid asjakohaste teemapealkirjadega, et kasutajad saaksid hõlpsasti hankida asjakohaseid artikleid institutsioonide hoidlatest. Kuna nendes hoidlates sisalduvate artiklite arv levib, on aga muutumas väljakutseks uute artiklite käsitsi samas tempos kataloogimine. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks uurime artiklite automaatse annoteerimise teostatavust Kongressi raamatukogu teemapealkirjadega (LCSH). Esmalt kasutame veebi kraapimist märksõnade väljavõtmiseks hoidla analüüsi ja mõõdikute portaalist (RAMP). Seejärel kaardistame need märksõnad LCSH nimedega kuldstandardi andmekogumi väljatöötamiseks. Juhtumiuuringuna, kasutades bioloogiaga seotud LCSH kontseptsioonide alamhulka, töötame välja ennustavad mudelid, formuleerides selle ülesande mitme märgisega klassifitseerimisprobleemina. Meie eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad selle lähenemisviisi elujõulisust LCSH prognoosimisel teaduslike artiklite jaoks.', 'cs': 'Ústavy jsou povinny katalogizovat své články s řádnými nadpisy předmětů, aby uživatelé mohli snadno načíst relevantní články z institucionálních repozitářů. Nicméně vzhledem k rychlosti šíření počtu článků v těchto repozitářích se stává výzvou ručně katalogizovat nově přidané články stejným tempem. Pro řešení této výzvy zkoumáme možnost automatického anotování článků pomocí nadpisů Library of Congress Subject Headings (LCSH). Nejprve používáme web scraping k extrakci klíčových slov pro sbírku článků z portálu RAMP (Repository Analytics and Metrics Portal). Poté mapujeme tato klíčová slova na LCSH názvy pro vývoj datové sady zlatého standardu. Jako případová studie s využitím podmnožiny LCSH konceptů souvisejících s biologií vyvíjíme prediktivní modely formulováním tohoto úkolu jako multi-label klasifikační problém. Naše experimentální výsledky ukazují životaschopnost tohoto přístupu pro predikci LCSH pro vědecké články.', 'ca': "Els instituts estan obligats a catalogar els seus articles amb títulos adequats de tema per a que els usuaris puguin obtenir fàcilment articles pertinents dels repositoris institucionals. However, due to the rate of proliferation of the number of articles in these repositories, it is becoming a challenge to manually catalog the newly added articles at the same pace.  Per abordar aquest repte, explorem la viabilitat d'anotar automàticament articles amb la Biblioteca de Subjectes del Congrés (LCSH). Primer fem servir l'arrastre web per extrair paraules clau per a una col·lecció d'articles del Portal d'Anàlisi de Repositoris i Metrics (RAMP). Llavors, mapem aquestes paraules clau als noms LCSH per desenvolupar un conjunt de dades d'or. Com a estudi de cas, utilitzant el subconjunt de conceptes LCSH relacionats amb la biologia, desenvolupem models preditius formulant aquesta tasca com un problema de classificació multietiquetada. Els nostres resultats experimentals demostren la viabilitat d'aquest enfocament per predir LCSH per a articles científics.", 'fi': 'Instituuttien on luetteloitava artikkelinsa oikeilla otsikoilla, jotta käyttäjät voivat helposti hakea asiaankuuluvat artikkelit institutionaalisista arkistoista. Koska näiden arkistojen artikkeleiden määrä lisääntyy, on kuitenkin tulossa haaste luetteloida uudet artikkelit manuaalisesti samaan tahtiin. Haasteeseen vastaamiseksi tutkimme, voidaanko artikkelit automaattisesti merkitä kongressin kirjaston aiheotsikoilla (LCSH). Käytämme ensin verkkokaavintaa avainsanojen poimimiseen artikkelikokoelmaan Repository Analytics and Metrics Portal (RAMP). Tämän jälkeen kartoitamme nämä avainsanat LCSH-nimiin kultaisen datajoukon kehittämistä varten. Tapaustutkimuksena kehitämme biologiaan liittyvien LCSH-konseptien osajoukkoa hyödyntäen ennustavia malleja muotoilemalla tämän tehtävän monimerkityksisenä luokitteluongelmana. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat tämän lähestymistavan toteuttamiskelpoisuuden ennustamiseksi tieteellisissä artikkeleissa.', 'jv': 'Instance Nanging Digawe mengko urip iki, kita ngubah akeh kapan kanggo ngilangno Artik sing automatik nggawe Library of kongres Subject Headings (LCSH). Awak dhéwé nggunakake perusahaan web nggawe kelas-kelas kanggo nggawe artik sing nang repoter Anatrack lan Metric Port (RMP). Sampeyan, kita gambar kelas kuwi kanggo nambah LCSH kanggo nggawe dataset nganggo dolanan sing isi. Tulung gadhah batasan manut, nggawe barang-sistem sampeyan nan ngerasahan LCSH ingkang sampeyan ingkang sampeyan karo nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas multi-label sak basang langgar. Rejalaké dhéwé éntuk sing ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno dianggap iki kanggo ngerasakno LCSH kanggo alih akeh dhéwé.', 'sk': 'Instituti morajo svoje članke katalogirati z ustreznimi naslovi teme, tako da lahko uporabniki zlahka pridobijo ustrezne članke iz institucionalnih repozitorijev. Vendar pa zaradi hitrosti širjenja števila člankov v teh repozitorijih postaja izziv ročno katalogizirati novo dodane članke z enakim tempom. Za reševanje tega izziva raziskujemo izvedljivost samodejnega označevanja člankov z naslovi subjektov Knjižnice kongresa (LCSH). Najprej uporabljamo spletno strganje za pridobivanje ključnih besed za zbirko člankov iz portala Repository Analytics and Metrics (RAMP). Nato te ključne besede preslikamo z imeni LCSH za razvoj zlatega standarda podatkov. Kot študija primera smo z uporabo podsklopa konceptov LCSH, povezanih z biologijo, razvili napovedne modele s formuliranjem te naloge kot problem razvrščanja z več oznakami. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati dokazujejo izvedljivost tega pristopa za napovedovanje LCSH za znanstvene članke.', 'ha': "Institutes are required to catalog their articles with proper subject headings so that the users can easily retrieve relevant articles from the institutional repositories.  A lokacin da aka tsawo wa yawan makallar cikin waɗannan bakarositori, yana kasa wata tsãwa dõmin a nuna makala na yanzu da aka ƙara karãtunsa cikin sami. To, da ya yi addu'a ga wannan tsohon, za mu nẽmi bayan an nuna makala farat ɗaya da Libraries of Subjekt na Kongress (LCAH). @ info: whatsthis Sa'an nan, muna karna wannan maɓalli zuwa sunayen LSSH dõmin ya buɗe wani tsari na danna na zĩnãriya na daidaita. Kama wani littãfi da ke amfani da ƙaramin kayan da aka yi danganta na LSAH na Bioloji, za'a buɗe misãlai na basĩri, ko za'a motsar wannan aikin da za'a bayyana shi kamar wata fitina mai yawa. MatarayinMu na jarrabi sun nuna bayan wannan hanyari wa ka yi bayani ga LSH wa makala masu sani.", 'bo': 'སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་དགོས་པ་དེ་ཚོའི་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་གཅིག་པུའི་གནད་དུས་ཀྱི་མགོ་མིང་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་ནང་དོན་དག ཡིན་ནའང་། མཛུད་ཁང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་གི་ཁྱད་ཚད་རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་ཚད་ལ་ཉེ་གནས་སྟངས་གཅིག་གི་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་ཁེལ་གསར་པ་ཚོ་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་སྣོད་བྱེད གདོང་ལེན་འདི་ལ་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནི་ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཡིག་ཆ་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་གཏན་ཁེལ་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་ཡིན། We first use web scraping to extract keywords for a collection of articles from the Repository Analytics and Metrics Portal (RAMP). འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་གཙོ་ཚིག་འདི་ཚོ་ནི་LCSH མིང་ལ་སྒྲིག As a case study, using the subset of Biology-related LCSH concepts, we develop predictive models by formulating this task as a multi-label classification problem. ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གི་གྲུབ', 'he': 'מוסדות נדרשות לקטלוג המאמרים שלהם עם כותרות נושאים נכונות כדי שהמשתמשים יוכלו בקלות להשיג מאמרים רלוונטיים מהמחסנים המוסדותיים. However, due to the rate of proliferation of the number of articles in these repositories, it is becoming a challenge to manually catalog the newly added articles at the same pace.  כדי להתמודד עם האתגר הזה, אנו חוקרים את אפשרות הערות אוטומטית של מאמרים עם ספריית הנושאים של הקונגרס (LCSH). אנחנו קודם משתמשים בגרד רשת כדי להוציא מילים מפתחות לאוסף מאמרים מפורטל האנליטיקה והמטריקה (RAMP). Then, we map these keywords to LCSH names for developing a gold-standard dataset.  בתור מחקר מקרים, בשימוש במערכת הרעיונות של LCSH קשורים לביולוגיה, אנחנו מפתחים דוגמנים צפויים על ידי ליצור את המשימה הזאת בתור בעיה מסווג רב-תווים. Our experimental results demonstrate the viability of this approach for predicting LCSH for scholarly articles.'}
{'en': 'Contrasting distinct structured views to learn sentence embeddings', 'es': 'Contrastar puntos de vista estructurados distintos para aprender a insertar oraciones', 'pt': 'Contrastando visões estruturadas distintas para aprender as incorporações de frases', 'ar': 'وجهات نظر منظمة ومختلفة متناقضة لتعلم زخرفة الجملة', 'fr': 'Opposition de vues structurées distinctes pour apprendre à intégrer des phrases', 'hi': 'वाक्य एम्बेडिंग सीखने के लिए अलग-अलग संरचित दृश्यों को विपरीत करना', 'zh': '比结构化视图学句嵌', 'ja': '文章の埋め込みを学ぶための明確な構造化されたビューの対比', 'ru': 'Контрастирование различных структурированных представлений для изучения вложений предложений', 'ga': 'Dearcaí struchtúrtha ar leith i gcodarsnacht chun leabú abairtí a fhoghlaim', 'ka': 'განსხვავებული სტრუქტურაციულ ხელსაწყობილობის კონტრექტირება', 'hu': 'Ellentétes strukturált nézetek a mondatbeágyazások tanulásához', 'el': 'Αντίθεση διακριτών δομημένων προβολών για εκμάθηση ενσωμάτωσης προτάσεων', 'it': 'Contrastare viste strutturate distinte per imparare le incorporazioni di frasi', 'mk': 'Контрастирање на различни структурни погледи за учење на вградувања на реченици', 'kk': 'Сөздерді ендіру үшін бөлек құрылған көріністер қарсы', 'ms': 'Menyegerakkan paparan struktur berbeza untuk belajar pelengkapan kalimat', 'lt': 'Skirtingų struktūrizuotų požiūrių prieštaravimas mokytis sakinių įtraukimo', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകള്\u200d അകത്തേക്ക് പഠിക്കാന്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത സ്ഥാപിച്ച കാഴ്ചകള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Өөр өөр бүтээгдэхүүний харилцааны эсрэг нь өгүүлбэрийг сурах', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Kontrastywanie odrębnych ustrukturyzowanych widoków, aby nauczyć się osadzeń zdań', 'si': 'වාක්ය සංවිධානය ඉගෙන ගන්න විශේෂ සංවිධානය ප්\u200dරකාරය', 'ro': 'Contrastul vizualizărilor structurate distincte pentru a afla încorporarea frazelor', 'sr': 'Kontrastujući različite strukturirane poglede kako bi naučili uključenje rečenica', 'so': 'Isku xiriirka aragtida kala duwan si aad u barto koritaanka ereyga', 'sv': 'Kontrastera distinkta strukturerade vyer för att lära sig meninginbäddningar', 'ta': 'வாக்கு உள்ளீடுகளை படிக்க வேண்டிய வித்தியாசமான உருவாக்கப்பட்ட காட்சிகளை உள்ளடக்குகிறது', 'ur': 'فرق ساختہ نظریں کی مخالفت کرتی ہیں کہ جماعت انڈینگ سکھاتے ہیں', 'mt': 'Kontrasti ta’ fehmiet strutturati distinti biex jitgħallmu l-inkorporazzjonijiet tas-sentenzi', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tương phản những quan điểm cấu trúc khác nhau để học sự tham gia án', 'da': 'Kontrastér forskellige strukturerede visninger for at lære sætningsindlejringer', 'nl': 'Contrasteren van verschillende gestructureerde weergaven om zinsinsluitingen te leren', 'hr': 'Kontrastiranje različitih strukturiranih pogleda kako bi naučio integriranje rečenica', 'bg': 'Контрастиране на различни структурирани изгледи, за да научите вграждания на изречения', 'id': 'Contrasting distinct structured views to learn sentence embeddings', 'fa': 'با توجه به دیدگاه ساختاری مختلف برای یاد گرفتن جمله\u200cها', 'de': 'Unterschiedliche strukturierte Ansichten kontrastieren, um Satzbedingungen zu lernen', 'sw': 'Kuhusiana na maoni tofauti yaliyotengenezwa ili kujifunza kifungu cha hukumu', 'tr': 'Sözler içine girişini öwrenmek üçin aýratyn strukturlyk görnöşi', 'af': 'Name', 'ko': '서로 다른 구조화된 보기를 비교하여 문장의 삽입을 배우다', 'am': 'የአሁኑን ፋይል አስቀምጥ', 'sq': 'Kontrastimi i pamjeve të strukturuara të veçanta për të mësuar përfshirjen e fjalëve', 'hy': 'Առանձնարար կառուցվածքային տեսանկյունների հակադրությունը նախադասությունների ներդրման սովորելու համար', 'az': 'Sözlük inşallarını öyrənmək üçün müxtəlif strukturlı görünüşlər ilə əlavə edilir', 'bn': 'বিভিন্ন কাঠামো দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি শিখার জন্য বিভিন্ন দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি যোগাযোগ করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Kontrastujući različite strukturirane poglede kako bi naučili integraciju rečenica', 'cs': 'Kontrastní odlišné strukturované pohledy pro naučení vkládání vět', 'ca': 'Contrasteixer vistes estructurades diferents per aprendre incorporacions de frases', 'et': 'Erinevate struktureeritud vaadete kontrastsus lause manustamise õppimiseks', 'fi': 'Erilaisten strukturoitujen näkymien vastakohta lauseiden upottamiseen', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'התנגדות לצפיות מובנות בודדות ללמוד תוספות משפטים', 'sk': 'Nasprotje različnih strukturiranih pogledov za učenje vdelav stavkov', 'bo': 'ཁྱད་དུ་འཕགས་པའི་དབྱིབས་སྒྲིག་ཀྱི་ལྟ་སྟངས་ལ་བསྒྱུར་བཞིན་པའི་ཚིག་རྟགས་སྦྱར་བ'}
{'en': 'We propose a self-supervised method that builds sentence embeddings from the combination of diverse explicit syntactic structures of a sentence. We assume structure is crucial to building consistent representations as we expect sentence meaning to be a function of both syntax and semantic aspects. In this perspective, we hypothesize that some linguistic representations might be better adapted given the considered task or sentence. We, therefore, propose to learn individual representation functions for different syntactic frameworks jointly. Again, by hypothesis, all such functions should encode similar semantic information differently and consequently, be complementary for building better sentential semantic embeddings. To assess such hypothesis, we propose an original contrastive multi-view framework that induces an explicit interaction between models during the training phase. We make experiments combining various structures such as dependency, constituency, or sequential schemes. Our results outperform comparable methods on several tasks from standard sentence embedding benchmarks.', 'fr': "Nous proposons une méthode auto-supervisée qui construit des intégrations de phrases à partir de la combinaison de diverses structures syntaxiques explicites d'une phrase. Nous supposons que la structure est cruciale pour construire des représentations cohérentes, car nous nous attendons à ce que la signification des phrases soit fonction des aspects syntaxiques et sémantiques. Dans cette perspective, nous émettons l'hypothèse que certaines représentations linguistiques pourraient être mieux adaptées compte tenu de la tâche ou de la phrase considérée. Nous proposons donc d'apprendre conjointement les fonctions de représentation individuelles pour différents cadres syntaxiques. Encore une fois, par hypothèse, toutes ces fonctions devraient coder différemment des informations sémantiques similaires et, par conséquent, être complémentaires pour construire de meilleures intégrations sémantiques sententielles. Pour évaluer une telle hypothèse, nous proposons un cadre multi-vues contrastif original qui induit une interaction explicite entre les modèles pendant la phase d'apprentissage. Nous réalisons des expériences combinant diverses structures telles que des schémas de dépendance, de regroupement ou de séquence. Nos résultats surpassent les méthodes comparables pour plusieurs tâches par rapport aux tests d'intégration de phrases standard.", 'es': 'Proponemos un método autosupervisado que construye incrustaciones de oraciones a partir de la combinación de diversas estructuras sintácticas explícitas de una oración. Asumimos que la estructura es crucial para construir representaciones consistentes, ya que esperamos que el significado de las oraciones sea una función de los aspectos sintácticos y semánticos. En esta perspectiva, planteamos la hipótesis de que algunas representaciones lingüísticas podrían adaptarse mejor dada la tarea u oración considerada. Por lo tanto, proponemos aprender funciones de representación individuales para diferentes marcos sintácticos de forma conjunta. De nuevo, por hipótesis, todas estas funciones deberían codificar información semántica similar de manera diferente y, en consecuencia, ser complementarias para construir mejores incrustaciones semánticas sentenciales. Para evaluar esta hipótesis, proponemos un marco multivista original y contrastante que induce una interacción explícita entre los modelos durante la fase de entrenamiento. Hacemos experimentos que combinan varias estructuras como la dependencia, la circunscripción o los esquemas secuenciales. Nuestros resultados superan a los métodos comparables en varias tareas de los puntos de referencia de incrustación de oraciones estándar.', 'ar': 'نحن نقترح طريقة تخضع للإشراف الذاتي والتي تبني زخارف الجمل من مزيج من التراكيب النحوية الصريحة المتنوعة للجملة. نحن نفترض أن البنية ضرورية لبناء تمثيلات متسقة لأننا نتوقع أن يكون معنى الجملة وظيفة لكل من الجوانب النحوية والدلالية. في هذا المنظور ، نفترض أن بعض التمثيلات اللغوية قد تتكيف بشكل أفضل مع الأخذ في الاعتبار المهمة أو الجملة المدروسة. لذلك ، نقترح تعلم وظائف التمثيل الفردي لأطر نحوية مختلفة بشكل مشترك. مرة أخرى ، من خلال الفرضية ، يجب أن تقوم كل هذه الوظائف بترميز المعلومات الدلالية المتشابهة بشكل مختلف ، وبالتالي تكون مكملة لبناء حفلات زفاف دلالية أفضل. لتقييم مثل هذه الفرضية ، نقترح إطارًا أصليًا متعدد وجهات النظر متباينًا يؤدي إلى تفاعل واضح بين النماذج أثناء مرحلة التدريب. نجري تجارب تجمع بين هياكل مختلفة مثل التبعية أو الدائرة الانتخابية أو المخططات المتسلسلة. تتفوق نتائجنا على الأساليب القابلة للمقارنة في العديد من المهام من معايير تضمين الجملة القياسية.', 'pt': 'Propomos um método autossupervisionado que constrói embeddings de sentenças a partir da combinação de diversas estruturas sintáticas explícitas de uma sentença. Assumimos que a estrutura é crucial para construir representações consistentes, pois esperamos que o significado da frase seja uma função de aspectos sintáticos e semânticos. Nessa perspectiva, levantamos a hipótese de que algumas representações linguísticas podem ser mais bem adaptadas diante da tarefa ou frase considerada. Propomos, portanto, aprender conjuntamente funções de representação individuais para diferentes frameworks sintáticos. Novamente, por hipótese, todas essas funções devem codificar informações semânticas semelhantes de forma diferente e, consequentemente, ser complementares para a construção de melhores embeddings semânticos sentenciais. Para avaliar tal hipótese, propomos um framework multi-view contrastivo original que induz uma interação explícita entre os modelos durante a fase de treinamento. Fazemos experimentos combinando várias estruturas, como dependência, constituinte ou esquemas sequenciais. Nossos resultados superam métodos comparáveis em várias tarefas de benchmarks de incorporação de sentenças padrão.', 'ja': '文の多様な明示的な構文構造の組み合わせから文の埋め込みを構築する自己監督的な方法を提案します。 文の意味が構文と意味の両方の側面の関数であることを期待するため、構造は一貫した表現を構築するために重要であると仮定します。 この観点では、考慮されたタスクまたは文章を考慮すると、いくつかの言語的表現がより適応される可能性があると仮定しています。 したがって、異なる構文フレームワークの個別表現関数を共同で学習することを提案します。 繰り返しになりますが、仮説として、すべてのそのような関数は、同様の意味情報を異なる方法で符号化する必要があり、結果として、より良い意味的埋め込みを構築するために補完的である必要があります。 そのような仮説を評価するために、私たちはトレーニング段階でモデル間の明示的な相互作用を誘発する独自の対照的なマルチビューフレームワークを提案します。 依存性、選挙区、連続スキームなど、さまざまな構造を組み合わせた実験を行っています。 当社の結果は、標準的な文埋め込みベンチマークからのいくつかのタスクで同等の方法を上回っています。', 'zh': '吾等建自督之法,当于句中结句显式句法嵌之。 吾设构于一致,盖欲句义为语法语义之函数也。 以此观之,吾设言可以适意者也。 是以建议共学异句法框架者个体示函数。 同是假设,诸函数皆宜以不同编码相似语义信,故于构善知语义嵌为互补。 为估假设,立一对比性多视图框架,当框架练阶诱模形之显式。 臣等实验,合诸结构,如依赖性,选区次第。 我们的果然在格句嵌入基准的几个职务上优于可较的方法。', 'hi': 'हम एक स्व-पर्यवेक्षित विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो एक वाक्य के विविध स्पष्ट वाक्यात्मक संरचनाओं के संयोजन से वाक्य एम्बेडिंग का निर्माण करता है। हम मानते हैं कि संरचना सुसंगत प्रतिनिधित्व के निर्माण के लिए महत्वपूर्ण है क्योंकि हम वाक्य अर्थ को वाक्यविन्यास और शब्दार्थ दोनों पहलुओं का एक कार्य होने की उम्मीद करते हैं। इस परिप्रेक्ष्य में, हम परिकल्पना करते हैं कि कुछ भाषाई प्रतिनिधित्व ों को विचार किए गए कार्य या वाक्य को देखते हुए बेहतर रूप से अनुकूलित किया जा सकता है। इसलिए, हम संयुक्त रूप से विभिन्न वाक्यात्मक ढांचे के लिए व्यक्तिगत प्रतिनिधित्व कार्यों को सीखने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। फिर से, परिकल्पना द्वारा, इस तरह के सभी कार्यों को समान शब्दार्थ जानकारी को अलग-अलग एन्कोड करना चाहिए और परिणामस्वरूप, बेहतर सेंसेंशियल सिमेंटिक एम्बेडिंग के निर्माण के लिए पूरक होना चाहिए। इस तरह की परिकल्पना का आकलन करने के लिए, हम एक मूल विरोधाभासी बहु-दृश्य ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो प्रशिक्षण चरण के दौरान मॉडल के बीच एक स्पष्ट बातचीत को प्रेरित करता है। हम निर्भरता, निर्वाचन क्षेत्र, या अनुक्रमिक योजनाओं जैसे विभिन्न संरचनाओं के संयोजन के प्रयोग करते हैं। हमारे परिणाम मानक वाक्य एम्बेडिंग बेंचमार्क से कई कार्यों पर तुलनीय तरीकों से बेहतर प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем метод самоконтроля, который строит вложения предложения из комбинации различных явных синтаксических структур предложения. Мы предполагаем, что структура имеет решающее значение для построения последовательных представлений, поскольку мы ожидаем, что значение предложения будет функцией как синтаксиса, так и семантических аспектов. В этой перспективе мы предполагаем, что некоторые лингвистические представления могут быть лучше адаптированы с учетом рассматриваемой задачи или предложения. Поэтому мы предлагаем совместно изучать функции индивидуального представления для различных синтаксических структур. Опять же, по гипотезе, все такие функции должны кодировать одинаковую семантическую информацию по-разному и, следовательно, быть взаимодополняющими для построения лучших смысловых семантических вложений. Для оценки такой гипотезы мы предлагаем оригинальный контрастный многовидовой каркас, который индуцирует явное взаимодействие между моделями на этапе обучения. Мы проводим эксперименты, объединяющие различные структуры, такие как зависимость, избирательность или последовательные схемы. Наши результаты превосходят сопоставимые методы по нескольким задачам из стандартных критериев встраивания предложений.', 'ga': 'Molaimid modh féin-mhaoirsithe a thógann leabú abairtí ón meascán de struchtúir chomhréire soiléire éagsúla d’abairt. Glacaimid leis go bhfuil struchtúr ríthábhachtach chun léirithe comhsheasmhacha a thógáil agus muid ag súil go mbeidh brí na habairte mar fheidhm de ghnéithe comhréire agus shéimeantacha araon. Sa pheirspictíocht seo, déanaimid hipitéis go bhféadfaí roinnt léirithe teanga a chur in oiriúint níos fearr i bhfianaise an taisc nó na habairte breithnithe. Tá sé beartaithe againn, mar sin, feidhmeanna ionadaíochta aonair a fhoghlaim le haghaidh creataí comhréire éagsúla. Arís, trí hipitéis, ba cheart go n-ionchódódh gach feidhm den sórt sin faisnéis shéimeantach dá samhail ar bhealach difriúil agus dá réir sin, ba cheart go mbeadh siad comhlántach chun leabaithe shéimeantacha tuartha níos fearr a thógáil. Chun hipitéis den sórt sin a mheasúnú, molaimid bunchreat codarsnachta ilamhairc a spreagann idirghníomhú follasach idir samhlacha le linn na céime oiliúna. Déanaimid turgnaimh a chomhcheanglaíonn struchtúir éagsúla cosúil le scéimeanna spleáchais, toghlaigh, nó seicheamhach. Sáraíonn ár dtorthaí modhanna inchomparáide ar roinnt tascanna ó thagarmharcanna caighdeánacha um leabú abairtí.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο αυτοεπίβλεψης που κατασκευάζει ενσωματώσεις προτάσεων από το συνδυασμό διαφορετικών ρητών συντακτικών δομών μιας πρότασης. Υποθέτουμε ότι η δομή είναι κρίσιμη για την οικοδόμηση συνεπών αναπαραστάσεων καθώς αναμένουμε ότι η έννοια της πρότασης θα είναι συνάρτηση τόσο της σύνταξης όσο και της σημασιολογικής πτυχής. Σε αυτή την προοπτική, υποθέτουμε ότι ορισμένες γλωσσικές αναπαραστάσεις θα μπορούσαν να προσαρμοστούν καλύτερα δεδομένης της εξεταζόμενης εργασίας ή πρότασης. Ως εκ τούτου, προτείνουμε να μάθουμε από κοινού μεμονωμένες λειτουργίες αναπαράστασης για διαφορετικά συντακτικά πλαίσια. Και πάλι, με υπόθεση, όλες αυτές οι λειτουργίες θα πρέπει να κωδικοποιούν παρόμοιες σημασιολογικές πληροφορίες διαφορετικά και κατά συνέπεια να είναι συμπληρωματικές για την οικοδόμηση καλύτερων σημασιολογικών ενσωμάτωσης. Για την αξιολόγηση αυτής της υπόθεσης, προτείνουμε ένα πρωτότυπο πλαίσιο αντιφατικών πολλαπλών οπτικών που προκαλεί μια ρητή αλληλεπίδραση μεταξύ των μοντέλων κατά τη διάρκεια της φάσης εκπαίδευσης. Κάνουμε πειράματα συνδυάζοντας διάφορες δομές όπως εξάρτηση, εκλογική περιφέρεια ή διαδοχικά σχήματα. Τα αποτελέσματά μας ξεπερνούν συγκρίσιμες μεθόδους σε διάφορες εργασίες από τα πρότυπα κριτήρια ενσωμάτωσης πρότασης.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მუშაობით თავიდან დავამუშავებული მეტი, რომელიც შექმნის სიტყვების კომბიზაციისგან განსხვავებული სინტაქტიური სტრუქტურების კომბიზაციაში შექმნი ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ, რომ სტრუქტურა მნიშვნელოვანია, როგორც ჩვენ დავიწყებთ, რომ სინტაქსი და სემონტიკი აპექტების ფუნქცია იყოს. ამ პერსპექტიკში ჩვენ ჰიპოტესტიზებთ, რომ რამდენიმე ლენგურისტიკური გამოსახულებები შეიძლება უფრო უკეთესი აეპორტიზება, რომელიც აღმოჩ ამიტომ ჩვენ განსხვავებული სინტექტიკური ფრამების განსხვავება განსხვავებული განსხვავებული ფრამების განსხვავებას დავისწავლოთ. ისევე, ჰიპოტეზეზით, ყველა ასეთი ფუნქციები უნდა განსხვავებული სიმენტიკური ინფორმაციას კონფიმენტურად კონფიმენტურად იყოს, რომ უკეთესი სიმენტიკური ინფორმა ასეთი ჰიპოტეზეზის განსაზღვრებისთვის, ჩვენ მინდომა ორიგინალური კონტრასტური მრავალური ხელსაწყოფილი ფრამეტრი, რომელიც მოდელების შორის გამოყენება განაზღვ ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტები გავაკეთებთ განსხვავებული სტრუქტურები, როგორც დაახლოებით, კონსტუქტურები, ან სექემები. ჩვენი წარმოდგენება უფრო შემდგენელი მეტოვების გავაკეთება რამდენიმე დავაკეთება სტანდარტური წარმოდგენებიდან.', 'hu': 'Javasolunk egy önfelügyelt módszert, amely mondatbeágyazásokat épít egy mondat különböző explicit szintaktikus struktúráinak kombinációjából. Feltételezzük, hogy a struktúra kulcsfontosságú a következetes reprezentációk építéséhez, mivel a mondatok jelentése mind a szintaxis, mind a szemantikai aspektusok függvénye. Ebben a szempontból feltételezzük, hogy egyes nyelvi reprezentációk jobban alkalmazkodhatnak az átgondolt feladat vagy mondat alapján. Ezért azt javasoljuk, hogy a különböző szintaktikus keretek egyéni reprezentációs funkcióit közösen tanuljuk meg. Ismét hipotézis szerint minden ilyen függvénynek másképp kell kódolnia a hasonló szemantikai információkat, és következésképpen kiegészítenie kell a jobb érzékenységi szemantikai beágyazások kialakításához. Az ilyen hipotézis értékeléséhez egy eredeti kontrasztív multi-view keretrendszert javasolunk, amely a modellek közötti explicit interakciót idézi elő az edzési fázisban. Kísérleteket végzünk különböző struktúrákat kombinálva, mint például a függőség, a választókerület vagy a szekvenciális sémák. Eredményeink több feladaton is felülmúlják az összehasonlítható módszereket.', 'kk': 'Біз сөйлемелерді түрлі синтактикалық құрылғылардың біріктіру әдісін өзімізге қарау әдісін таңдаймыз. Біз құрылымыз синтаксис және семантикалық аспекттердің функциясы дегенді күтпей тұратындарды құру үшін маңызды деп ойлаймыз. Бұл перспективде біз лингвистикалық кейбір түрлендірулердің тапсырманы немесе сөйлендіру үшін жақсы адаптациялануға мүмкін деп ойлаймыз. Сондықтан біз басқа синтактикалық фреймдер үшін индивидуалды таңдау функцияларын біріктіруге ұсынамыз. Қайталап, бұл функциялардың барлығы бірнеше симантикалық мәліметін кодтамасыз және содан кейін, мәліметтерді жақсы семантикалық ендіру үшін қосымша болу керек. Бұл гипотезаны оқу үшін біз бастапқы көптеген көптеген көптеген көрініс фреймін ұсынамыз. Бұл моделдердің ортасындағы тәжірибесін түсінікті ұсынамыз. Біз әртүрлі құрылғыларды, тәуелдік, тәуелдік, немесе кейінгі сұлбаларды біріктіру тәжірибелерін жасаймыз. Біздің нәтижелеріміз стандартты сұлбалардың бірнеше тапсырмалардан салыстырылатын әдістерді жасайды.', 'it': "Proponiamo un metodo auto-supervisionato che costruisce incorporazioni di frasi dalla combinazione di diverse strutture sintattiche esplicite di una frase. Assumiamo che la struttura sia fondamentale per costruire rappresentazioni coerenti in quanto ci aspettiamo che il significato di frase sia una funzione sia di sintassi che di aspetti semantici. In questa prospettiva, si ipotizza che alcune rappresentazioni linguistiche potrebbero essere meglio adattate dato il compito o la frase considerati. Proponiamo quindi di imparare congiuntamente le singole funzioni di rappresentazione per diversi framework sintattici. Ancora una volta, per ipotesi, tutte queste funzioni dovrebbero codificare in modo diverso informazioni semantiche simili e, di conseguenza, essere complementari per costruire migliori incorporazioni semantiche sentimentali. Per valutare tale ipotesi, proponiamo un originale quadro multi-view contrastante che induce un'interazione esplicita tra i modelli durante la fase di allenamento. Facciamo esperimenti combinando varie strutture come dipendenza, circoscrizione o schemi sequenziali. I nostri risultati superano metodi comparabili in diverse attività dai benchmark standard di inserimento delle frasi.", 'lt': 'We propose a self-supervised method that builds sentence embeddings from the combination of diverse explicit syntactic structures of a sentence.  Mes manome, kad struktūra yra labai svarbi nuosekliam atstovavimui kurti, nes tikimės, kad sakinys reikštų tiek sintakso, tiek semantinių aspektų funkciją. Šiuo atžvilgiu mes darome prielaidą, kad kai kurie kalbiniai atstovai galėtų būti geriau pritaikyti atsižvelgiant į svarstomą užduotį ar sakinį. Todėl mes siūlome bendrai išmokti atskiras įvairių sintetinių sistemų atstovavimo funkcijas. Be to, remiantis hipoteze, visos tokios funkcijos turėtų skirtingai koduoti panašią semantinę informaciją ir todėl papildyti geresnius baudžiamuosius semantinius įterpimus. Norėdami įvertinti tokią hipotezę, siūlome pradinę kontrastinę daugialypę sistemą, kuri skatintų aiškią modelių sąveiką mokymo etape. Darome eksperimentus, derinančius įvairias struktūras, pvz., priklausomybę, rinkimų apygardą ar sekacines sistemas. Our results outperform comparable methods on several tasks from standard sentence embedding benchmarks.', 'mk': 'Ние предложуваме метод за самонадгледување кој гради реченици вклучени од комбинацијата на различни експлицитни синтактички структури на реченица. Претпоставуваме дека структурата е клучна за изградба на константни претставувања бидејќи очекуваме реченицата да значи функција на синтаксични и семантични аспекти. In this perspective, we hypothesize that some linguistic representations might be better adapted given the considered task or sentence.  Затоа ние предлагаме заедно да научиме индивидуални функции на претставување за различни синтактички рамки. Повторно, според хипотезата, сите вакви функции треба да ги кодираат сличните семантични информации различно и, како последица, да бидат комплементарни за изградба на подобри семантични реченици. За да ја процениме ваквата хипотеза, предложуваме оригинална контрастивна мултипогледна рамка која индуцира експлицитна интеракција помеѓу моделите за време на фазата на обука. Правиме експерименти кои комбинираат различни структури како што е зависноста, изборниот округ или секвенцијалните шеми. Нашите резултати ги надминуваат споредливите методи на неколку задачи од стандардните реченици кои вклучуваат реченици.', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu metodu awtosorveljat li jibni inkorporazzjonijiet tas-sentenzi mill-kombinazzjoni ta’ strutturi sintattiċi espliċiti differenti ta’ sentenza. We assume structure is crucial to building consistent representations as we expect sentence meaning to be a function of both syntax and semantic aspects.  In this perspective, we hypothesize that some linguistic representations might be better adapted given the considered task or sentence.  Għalhekk, nipproponu li nitgħallmu b’mod konġunt funzjonijiet ta’ rappreżentanza individwali għal oqfsa sintattiċi differenti. Għal darb’oħra, permezz ta’ ipoteżi, dawn il-funzjonijiet kollha għandhom jikkodifikaw informazzjoni semantika simili b’mod differenti u konsegwentement, ikunu kumplimentari għall-bini ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet semantiċi sentenzjali aħjar. Biex tivvaluta din l-ipoteżi, qed nipproponu qafas oriġinali ta’ diversi viżijiet kontrastivi li jinduċi interazzjoni espliċita bejn mudelli matul il-fażi tat-taħriġ. Aħna nagħmlu esperimenti li jgħaqqdu diversi strutturi bħad-dipendenza, il-kostitwenza, jew skemi sekwenzjali. Ir-riżultati tagħna jaqbżu l-metodi komparabbli fuq diversi kompiti minn sentenzi standard li jinkorporaw punti ta’ riferiment.', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan kaedah yang mengawasi diri sendiri yang membina kandungan kalimat dari kombinasi struktur sintaktik yang jelas berbeza dalam kalimat. Kita anggap struktur penting untuk membina perwakilan konsisten kerana kita mengharapkan kalimat bermakna menjadi fungsi dari aspek sintaks dan semantik. In this perspective, we hypothesize that some linguistic representations might be better adapted given the considered task or sentence.  Oleh itu, kami mengusulkan untuk belajar fungsi perwakilan individu untuk bingkai sintaktik berbeza bersama-sama. Sekali lagi, dengan hipotesis, semua fungsi seperti ini sepatutnya mengekodkan maklumat semantik yang sama dengan berbeza dan sebaliknya, menjadi kumplimentar untuk membina bentuk semantik kalimat yang lebih baik. Untuk menilai hipotesis seperti itu, kami melamar kerangka berbilang-pandangan bertentangan asal yang mengakibatkan interaksi eksplicit antara model semasa fase latihan. Kami membuat eksperimen menggabungkan struktur-struktur berbeza seperti dependensi, constituency, atau skema berturut-turut. Hasil kita melebihi kaedah yang boleh dibandingkan pada beberapa tugas dari kalimat piawai memasukkan tanda referensi.', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകളുടെ വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വ്യക്തമായ സിനിട്ടാക്ടിക്കൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d നിന്ന് വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപെടുത്തുന്ന ഒരു സ്വയം നിരീക്ഷിക നമ്മള്\u200d കരുതുന്നത് സിന്റാക്സിന്\u200dറെയും സെമാന്റിക് ഭാഗങ്ങളുടെയും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണെന്നാണ്. ഈ ദൃഷ്ടിയില്\u200d, ചില ഭാഷക്കാരുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d മാറ്റപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതാണെന്ന് നമുക്ക് തോന്നുന്നു. We, therefore, propose to learn individual representation functions for different syntactic frameworks jointly.  വീണ്ടും ഹൈപ്പോട്ടീസിസ്സിനാല്\u200d, ഇതുപോലുള്ള എല്ലാ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളും വ്യത്യസ്തമായി സെമാന്റിക് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കോഡിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യണം. അതിനു ഇത്തരം ഹൈപ്പിയറ്റസിയെ പരിഗണിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സമയത്ത് മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d വ്യക്തമായി തമ്മിലുള്ള പരസ്പരം നടത്തുന്ന ഒരു മൂല്ലിക നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ക്രമീകരണങ്ങളെ കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്ന പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു, ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നത്, സംഘടനയോ  നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് തുല്യമായ രീതികള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് സാധാരണ വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും കൂടുതല്\u200d ജോലികള', 'mn': 'Бид өөрсдийгөө удирдлагатай арга зааж өгүүлбэрийг өгүүлбэрийн олон тодорхой шинжлэх ухааны бүтэц бүтээгдэхүүнээс бий болгож байна. Бид бүтцийг тогтмол үзүүлэлтийг бүтээхэд чухал гэж боддог. Яагаад гэвэл өгүүлэлт нь синтаксис болон semantic талуудын функц гэж боддог. Энэ тохиолдолд бид хэн нэгэн хэлний үзүүлэлт нь ажил эсвэл өгүүлбэрээс илүү сайхан зохицуулах боломжтой гэж боддог. Тиймээс бид өөр шинжлэх ухааны хэлбэрүүдийн хувилбарын функцүүдийг хамтдаа суралцах санал өгдөг. Дахин бодлоор, эдгээр бүх функцүүд ижил хэмжээний мэдээллийг өөр өөр хэлбэрээр шинэчлэх хэрэгтэй. Үүний дараа нь илүү шинэ мэдээллийн хэмжээсүүдийг бүтээхэд нэмэгдүүлэх хэрэгтэй. Ийм тодорхойлолтыг үнэлэхээр бид сургалтын дасгалын үед загварын хоорондын тодорхой харилцааны тухай эхний эсрэг олон харилцааны хэлбэрийг санал болгож байна. Бид өөр өөр бүтцийг нэгтгэх туршилтуудыг хийдэг. Бидний үр дүнд стандарт өгүүлбэрээс хэдэн ажил дээр харьцуулагдах арга зам гаргадаг.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy metodę samodzielnie nadzorowaną budującą osadzenia zdań z połączenia różnorodnych wyraźnych struktur składni zdania. Zakładamy, że struktura ma kluczowe znaczenie dla budowania spójnych reprezentacji, ponieważ oczekujemy, że znaczenie zdania będzie funkcją zarówno składni, jak i aspektów semantycznych. W tej perspektywie zakładamy hipotezę, że niektóre reprezentacje językowe mogą być lepiej dostosowane biorąc pod uwagę rozważane zadanie lub zdanie. Proponujemy zatem wspólną naukę poszczególnych funkcji reprezentacyjnych dla różnych ram składni. Ponownie, według hipotezy, wszystkie takie funkcje powinny kodować podobne informacje semantyczne inaczej i w konsekwencji być uzupełniające dla budowania lepszych sentencjalnych osadzeń semantycznych. Aby ocenić taką hipotezę, proponujemy oryginalny kontrastywny multi-view framework, który wywołuje wyraźną interakcję między modelami w fazie treningowej. Przeprowadzamy eksperymenty łączące różne struktury takie jak zależność, okręg wyborczy czy schematy sekwencyjne. Nasze wyniki przewyższają porównywalne metody w kilku zadaniach od standardowych standardowych standardów osadzania zdań.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo samoopraćenu metodu koja izgradi uvođenje rečenica iz kombinacije različitih ekskluzivnih sintaktičkih struktura rečenice. Pretpostavljamo da je struktura ključna za izgradnju konsekventnih predstavljanja jer očekujemo da rečenica znači biti funkcija sintaksa i semantičnih aspekta. U ovoj perspektivi hipotezujemo da bi neki jezički predstavnici mogli biti bolje prilagođeni s obzirom na razmatranje zadataka ili rečenice. Stoga predlažemo da učimo individualne funkcije zastupanja za različite sintaktičke okvire zajedno. Ponovo, po hipotezi, sve takve funkcije bi trebale da kodiraju slične semantičke informacije drugačije i stoga, budu komplementne za izgradnju boljih sentencijalnih semantičkih ugrađenja. Da bismo procenili takvu hipotezu, predložili smo originalni kontrastni višestruki okvir koji inducira eksplicitnu interakciju između modela tokom faze obuke. Napravimo eksperimente u kombinaciji različitih struktura poput ovisnosti, sastavnosti ili sekvencijskih šema. Naši rezultati iznose usporedne metode na nekoliko zadataka iz standardne rečenice koji uključuju kritike.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår ein sjølvoversikt metode som bygger setningar frå kombinasjonen av ulike eksplisitte syntaktiske strukturer av eit setning. Vi antar at strukturen er viktig for å bygge konsistent representasjonar som vi forventar setninga som betyr at det er ein funksjon av både syntaks og semantiske aspektar. I denne perspektiven er vi hypotesisert at nokre lingviske representasjonar kan vera bedre tilpassa oppgåva eller setninga. Vi foreslår derfor å lære individuelle representasjonsfunksjonar for ulike syntaksiske rammeverk. Eit gong bør alle slike funksjonar koda liknande semantiske informasjon ulike og derfor komplementare for å bygge betre sentensielle semantiske innbygging. For å vurdere slike hipotese, foreslår vi eit opprinnelig kontrastiv multivisingsrammeverk som induserer ein eksplisitt samarbeid mellom modeller under opplæringsfasen. Vi gjer eksperimenter som kombinerer ulike strukturar som avhengighet, konstitusjon, eller sekvensiske skjema. Resultatet våre utfører sammenlignbare metodar på fleire oppgåver frå standard setningar som innebyr benchmarker.', 'so': "Waxaannu horumarinaynaa qaab ay isu ilaaliyaan oo dhisaysaa xukunka ka soo baxa ururka dhismaha isbitaalka kala duduwan ee xuquuqda. Waxaynu malaynaynaa in dhismaha dhismaha qof ka mid ah, sababtoo ah waxaan rajaynaynaa in ay tahay shaqo ka mid ah labada dhinac ee kaarista iyo qayb ka mid ah. Fiirinkan, waxaynu ka fekernaa in qaar ka mid ah wakiilada luuqadaha qaarkood si wanaagsan looga beddeli karo shaqo ama go'aan. Sidaas darteed waxaan horumarinaynaa in aynu barno shaqooyin gaar ah oo aan u barno firaaqado kala duduwan. Haddana waxaa kaloo ah in dhammaan shaqooyinkaas oo kale ay ku kooban yihiin macluumaad kala duwan oo kala duduwan, taas darteed ay u adag yihiin dhismaha kaleemeysiga oo ka wanaagsan. Si aan loo qiimeeyo fikrad caynkaas ah, waxaan u soo jeedaynaa qoraal asal ah oo kala duwan oo kala duduwan, kaas oo muuqata isku xiriir cad oo u dhexeeya samooyinka xiliga tababarka waxbarashada. Waxaannu sameynaa jirrabo ku xiran dhismo kala duduwan, tusaale ahaan ku xiran, dhamaansho ama qorshaha xilliga ah. Abaalkeena waxay ka samaysaa qaabab u eg shaqooyin badan oo ka soo baxa xafiiska standardka ee ku qoran bangiyada.", 'ro': 'Propunem o metodă auto-supravegheată care construiește încorporări de propoziții din combinația diverselor structuri sintactice explicite ale unei propoziții. Presupunem că structura este crucială pentru construirea reprezentărilor consecvente, deoarece ne așteptăm ca sensul frazei să fie o funcție atât a sintaxei, cât și a aspectelor semantice. În această perspectivă, presupunem că unele reprezentări lingvistice ar putea fi mai bine adaptate având în vedere sarcina sau propoziția luată în considerare. Prin urmare, propunem să învățăm împreună funcțiile individuale de reprezentare pentru diferite cadre sintactice. Din nou, prin ipoteză, toate aceste funcții ar trebui să codeze informații semantice similare diferit și, prin urmare, să fie complementare pentru construirea unor încorporări semantice sentimentale mai bune. Pentru a evalua o astfel de ipoteză, propunem un cadru original contrastant multi-view care induce o interacțiune explicită între modele în timpul fazei de antrenament. Facem experimente care combină diferite structuri, cum ar fi dependența, circumscripția sau schemele secvențiale. Rezultatele noastre depășesc metodele comparabile pentru mai multe sarcini de referință standard de încorporare a frazelor.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ස්වයංග්\u200dරහයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන විධානයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා කියලා වාර්තාවක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා. අපි බලාපොරොත්තු කරනවා සංවේදනය සහ සාමාන්තික ප්\u200dරතිරූපයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කියලා. මේ ප්\u200dරදේශයෙන්, අපි හිතන්නේ කියලා භාෂාත්මක ප්\u200dරදේශනයක් හොඳයි කියලා හිතන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට වැඩ ඉතින්, අපි වෙනස් සංකේතික සංකේතික සංකේතික වැඩසටහන් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරතිකෘති වැඩසටහ ආයෙත්, විශ්වාසයෙන්, සියළු වැඩක් වගේ සෙමැන්ටික් තොරතුරු වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් සෙමාන්ටික් තොරතුරු සංව අනිවාර්යාත්මක විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරධාන විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විශ්වාස කරනවා මොඩේ අපි පරීක්ෂණයක් කරනවා විවිධ ස්ථානයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා වගේම විවිධ ස්ථානයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා වගේම අපේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200d', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår en självövervakad metod som bygger meningsinbäddningar från kombinationen av olika explicita syntaktiska strukturer i en mening. Vi antar att strukturen är avgörande för att bygga konsekventa representationer eftersom vi förväntar oss att mening mening ska vara en funktion av både syntax och semantiska aspekter. I detta perspektiv hypoteser vi att vissa språkliga representationer skulle kunna anpassas bättre med tanke på den övervägda uppgiften eller meningen. Vi föreslår därför att lära oss individuella representationsfunktioner för olika syntaktiska ramverk gemensamt. Återigen, genom hypotes, alla sådana funktioner bör koda liknande semantisk information annorlunda och följaktligen komplettera för att bygga bättre sentimentala semantiska inbäddningar. För att bedöma en sådan hypotes föreslår vi en original kontrastiv multi-view ramverk som inducerar en explicit interaktion mellan modeller under träningsfasen. Vi gör experiment som kombinerar olika strukturer som beroende, valkrets eller sekventiella system. Våra resultat överträffar jämförbara metoder på flera uppgifter från standard meningsinbäddning benchmarks.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک اپنی نظارت کی طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو ایک جماعت کے مختلف مختلف سینٹکتیک ساختاروں کی ترکیب سے جمع کرتا ہے. ہم نے سمجھ لیا ہے کہ ساختار سائل کی تعبیر کے لئے ضروری ہے جس طرح ہم کلمہ کا ارادہ کررہے ہیں کہ سینٹکس اور سیمنٹی الگوں کا فعال ہو۔ اس نظر میں ہم فرض کرتے ہیں کہ بعض زبان کی تعلیمات اچھی طرح کے ساتھ اچھی طرح کی جاسکتی ہیں، اس کے ذریعہ سے جو نظر کیا گیا ہے، یا کلام کے ذریعہ سے۔ تو ہم نے مختلف سینٹاکتیک فرمورک کے لئے فرض کرنے کے لئے فرض کرنے کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے۔ دوبارہ، فرضی کے ذریعہ، تمام ایسے فعالیتوں کو مختلف سیمنٹی معلومات کے ساتھ پیدا کرنا چاہیے اور اس کے بعد بہتر سنتی سیمنٹی انڈینگ بنانے کے لئے اضافہ کرنا چاہیے۔ ہم نے ایسی فرضی کی آزمائش کے لئے ایک اصلی مخالف متعدد نظر فریمیٹ کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جو مدلکوں کے درمیان تدریس فاز میں ایک صاف تدریج اختیار کرتا ہے. ہم آزمائش کرتے ہیں جن میں مختلف ساختاروں کو جوڑ رہے ہیں جیسے اعتباری، حکومت، یا سفارشی طرح. ہمارے نتیجے بہت سے کاموں پر مقایسہ طریقے انجام دیتے ہیں جو استاندارڈ جماعت میں بنچم مارک بناتے ہیں۔', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு தானே கண்காணிக்கப்படுத்தப்பட்ட முறையில் ஒரு வாக்கியத்தின் வாக்கு உள்ளிடப்பட்டுள்ளதை கட்டும் வாக்கியத்திலிருந்த நாங்கள் நினைக்கிறோம் கட்டமைப்பு முக்கியமானது என்று நாம் எதிர்பார்க்கிறோம் வாக்கியத்தின் அர்த்தம் இரு ஒத்திசைந்து மற இந்த முன்னோட்டத்தில், சில மொழிகளின் குறிப்புகள் சிலவற்றை மாற்றியமைக்கலாம் என்று நாம் நினைக்கிறோம் என்று கரு எனவே, நாங்கள் தனிப்பட்ட பிரதிநிதி செயல்பாடு மீண்டும், hypothesis, அனைத்து செயல்பாடுகளும் அதே போன்ற பாதிப்பு தகவல்களை குறிக்க வேண்டும் மற்றும் அதனால் சிறந்த உணர்வு அரைப்புருவுகளை  இத்தகைய hypothesis மதிப்பீடு, பயிற்சி காட்சியில் மாதிரிகளுக்கு இடையே ஒரு வெளிப்படையான இடைவெளிப்படையான இடைவெளிப்படையான இடைவெளி நம்பிக்கை, நிகழ்வு, அல்லது பின்வரும் திட்டங்களை சேர்த்து சோதனைகளை செய்கிறோம். நிலையான வாக்கியத்தில் இருந்து நிலையான வாக்கியில் இருந்து பொருத்தமான முறைகளை செயல்படுத்துகிறது.', 'uz': "Biz bir so'zning bir xil bir xil bir xil syntactik strukturalarini birlashtirish usulini tahlil qilamiz. We assume structure is crucial to building consistent representations as we expect sentence meaning to be a function of both syntax and semantic aspects.  Bu ko'rinida biz bir necha tillar xususiyatlarini o'zgartirishimiz mumkin. Шундай қилиб, biz bir necha sintaktik freymlari uchun bir xil represent funksiyalarini o'rganish talab qilamiz. Keyin hypothesis bilan, bu hamma funksiyalar boshqa bir xil semantik maʼlumotini kodlash kerak va shunday paytda yaxshi sentensik semantik tuzilishi uchun murakkablik bo'lishi kerak. Bu kabi hypothesis haqida o'ylash uchun biz taʼminlovchi darajadagi bir ko'plab-ko'rinadigan asl muloqon freymni rivojlanishimiz mumkin. Biz tasavvur qilamiz, tashkilot, yoki keyingi xil qoliplarni birlashtirish mumkin. Bizning natijalarimiz bir necha vazifalarni o'zgartirish imkoniyatlaridan foydalanadi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp tự giám sát để xây dựng sự cấy ghép từ các cấu trúc cấu trúc nhào lộn rõ ràng của một câu. Chúng tôi cho rằng cấu trúc rất quan trọng để xây dựng các biểu hiện liên tục vì chúng tôi mong rằng câu nói sẽ trở thành một phần của cú pháp và ngữ pháp. Theo quan điểm này, chúng tôi giả định rằng một số biểu đồ ngôn ngữ có thể thích nghi tốt hơn dựa trên nhiệm vụ hoặc câu đã cân nhắc. Chúng tôi đề nghị nên học các chức năng đại diện cá nhân cho các cấu trúc cú pháp khác nhau. Một lần nữa, theo giả thuyết, tất cả các chức năng này phải mã hóa các thông tin ngữ pháp giống nhau theo cách khác nhau và như thế, bổ sung cho việc xây dựng những sự tác động khái niệm. Để đánh giá giả thuyết này, chúng tôi đề xuất một cơ sở đa dạng tương phản nguyên bản có thể tạo ra sự tương tác rõ ràng giữa các mẫu trong suốt giai đoạn huấn luyện. Chúng tôi tiến hành thí nghiệm kết hợp các cấu trúc khác nhau như phụ thuộc, bầu cử hay các kế hoạch. Kết quả của chúng tôi cung cấp các phương pháp tương ứng với nhiều nhiệm vụ từ những tiêu chuẩn.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме самоконтролиран метод, който изгражда вграждания на изречения от комбинацията от различни изрични синтактични структури на изречение. Предполагаме, че структурата е от решаващо значение за изграждането на последователни представи, тъй като очакваме смисъла на изречението да бъде функция както на синтаксиса, така и на семантичните аспекти. В тази перспектива хипотезата е, че някои лингвистични представи могат да бъдат по-добре адаптирани предвид разглежданата задача или изречение. Затова предлагаме съвместно да се научат индивидуални функции за представяне на различни синтактични рамки. Отново, по хипотеза, всички такива функции трябва да кодират подобна семантична информация по различен начин и следователно да се допълват за изграждането на по-добри сентенциални семантични вграждания. За да оценим тази хипотеза, предлагаме оригинална контрастна мулти-гледна рамка, която предизвиква изрично взаимодействие между моделите по време на етапа на обучение. Правим експерименти, съчетаващи различни структури като зависимост, избирателен район или последователни схеми. Нашите резултати превъзхождат сравнимите методи при няколко задачи от стандартните показатели за вграждане на изречения.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en selvovervåget metode, der bygger sætningsindlejringer ud fra kombinationen af forskellige eksplicitte syntaktiske strukturer i en sætning. Vi antager, at struktur er afgørende for at opbygge konsekvente repræsentationer, da vi forventer, at sætninger betyder at være en funktion af både syntaks og semantiske aspekter. I dette perspektiv antager vi, at nogle sproglige repræsentationer kan være bedre tilpasset i betragtning af den overvejede opgave eller sætning. Vi foreslår derfor at lære individuelle repræsentationsfunktioner for forskellige syntaktiske rammer i fællesskab. Igen, ved hypotese, bør alle sådanne funktioner kode lignende semantisk information forskelligt og dermed være komplementære for at opbygge bedre sentimental semantisk indlejring. For at vurdere en sådan hypotese foreslår vi en original kontrastiv multi-view ramme, der inducerer en eksplicit interaktion mellem modeller i træningsfasen. Vi laver eksperimenter, der kombinerer forskellige strukturer såsom afhængighed, valgkreds eller sekventielle ordninger. Vores resultater overgår sammenlignelige metoder på flere opgaver fra standard sætningsindlejring benchmarks.', 'nl': "We stellen een zelfbegeleide methode voor die zinsinbeddingen bouwt uit de combinatie van diverse expliciete syntactische structuren van een zin. We gaan ervan uit dat structuur cruciaal is voor het bouwen van consistente representaties omdat we verwachten dat de zin een functie is van zowel syntaxis als semantische aspecten. In dit perspectief stellen we de hypothese dat sommige linguïstische representaties beter kunnen worden aangepast gezien de overwogen taak of zin. Daarom stellen we voor om individuele representatiefuncties voor verschillende syntactische kaders gezamenlijk te leren. Nogmaals, door hypothese, zouden al deze functies soortgelijke semantische informatie anders moeten coderen en bijgevolg complementair moeten zijn voor het bouwen van betere sententiële semantische embeddings. Om deze hypothese te beoordelen, stellen we een origineel contrastief multi-view framework voor dat een expliciete interactie tussen modellen induceert tijdens de trainingsfase. We experimenteren met verschillende structuren zoals afhankelijkheid, kiesdistrict of opeenvolgende schema's. Onze resultaten presteren beter dan vergelijkbare methoden op verschillende taken van standaard zinsinbeddingsbenchmarks.", 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan metode yang diawasi oleh diri sendiri yang membangun pembangunan kalimat dari kombinasi struktur sintaksi eksplicit berbeda dari kalimat. Kami menganggap struktur penting untuk membangun representation konsisten karena kita mengharapkan kalimat artinya menjadi fungsi dari aspek sintaks dan semantis. Dalam perspektif ini, kita hipotesis bahwa beberapa representation bahasa mungkin lebih sesuai dengan tugas atau kalimat yang dianggap. Oleh karena itu, kami mengusulkan untuk belajar fungsi perwakilan individu untuk bingkai sintaksi berbeda bersama-sama. Sekali lagi, dengan hipotesis, semua fungsi seperti ini harus mengkode informasi semantis yang sama dengan berbeda dan konsekuensinya, menjadi komplementari untuk membangun embedding semantis kalimat yang lebih baik. To assess such hypothesis, we propose an original contrastive multi-view framework that induces an explicit interaction between models during the training phase.  Kami membuat eksperimen menggabungkan berbagai struktur seperti dependensi, konstitusi, atau skema sekuensi. Hasil kita melebihi metode yang bisa dibandingkan pada beberapa tugas dari kalimat standar memasukkan benchmarks.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo samoopraćenu metodu koja izgradi uvođenje rečenica iz kombinacije različitih izravnih sintaktičkih struktura rečenice. Pretpostavljamo da je struktura ključna za izgradnju konsekventnih predstavljanja jer očekujemo da će rečenica značiti funkciju sintaksa i semantičkih aspekta. U ovoj perspektivi, pretpostavljamo da bi neki jezički predstavnici mogli biti bolje prilagođeni s obzirom na razmotreni zadatak ili kaznu. Stoga predlažemo da zajedno naučimo pojedinačne funkcije zastupanja za različite sintaktičke okvire. Opet, po hipotezi, sve takve funkcije bi trebale kodirati slične semantičke informacije drugačije i stoga, biti komplementne za izgradnju boljih sentencijalnih semantičkih ugrađenja. Da bismo procijenili takvu hipotezu, predlažemo originalni kontrastveni višestruki okvir koji inducira izraženu interakciju između modela tijekom faze obuke. Napravimo eksperimente u kombinaciji različitih struktura poput ovisnosti, sastavnosti ili sekvencijskih šema. Naši rezultati iznose usporedbene metode na nekoliko zadataka iz standardne rečenice koji uključuju kriterije.', 'ko': '우리는 문장의 서로 다른 현식 문법 구조 조합에서 문장 삽입을 구축하는 자체 감독 방법을 제시했다.우리는 구조가 일치된 표현을 구축하는 데 매우 중요하다고 생각한다. 왜냐하면 우리는 문장의 의미가 문법과 의미 방면의 함수라고 생각하기 때문이다.이런 측면에서 볼 때, 우리는 고려된 임무나 문장을 고려하면 일부 언어 표징이 더욱 잘 적응할 수 있다고 가정한다.따라서 우리는 서로 다른 문법 구조 아래의 개체 표징 함수를 연합하여 배울 것을 건의한다.마찬가지로 가설에 따르면 모든 이러한 기능은 서로 다른 방식으로 비슷한 의미 정보를 인코딩하여 더욱 좋은 문장의 의미 삽입을 구축하기 위해 보충을 제공해야 한다.이런 가설을 평가하기 위해 우리는 원시적인 대비 다시각 구조를 제시했는데 이 구조는 훈련 단계에서 유도 모델 간의 현식 상호작용을 유도한다.우리는 의존, 선택, 순서 방안 등 각종 구조와 결합하여 실험을 진행한다.우리의 결과는 표준 문장이 기준 테스트에 삽입된 몇 가지 임무에서 비교할 수 있는 방법보다 우수하다.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen eine selbstüberwachte Methode vor, die Satzbedingungen aus der Kombination verschiedener expliziter syntaktischer Strukturen eines Satzes aufbaut. Wir gehen davon aus, dass Struktur entscheidend für den Aufbau konsistenter Repräsentationen ist, da wir erwarten, dass die Satzneutung eine Funktion sowohl der Syntax als auch der semantischen Aspekte ist. In dieser Perspektive gehen wir davon aus, dass einige sprachliche Darstellungen angesichts der betrachteten Aufgabe oder des Satzes besser angepasst werden könnten. Wir schlagen daher vor, einzelne Repräsentationsfunktionen für verschiedene syntaktische Frameworks gemeinsam zu erlernen. Auch hier sollten alle derartigen Funktionen ähnliche semantische Informationen unterschiedlich kodieren und folglich komplementär für den Aufbau besserer sententialer semantischer Einbettungen sein. Um diese Hypothese zu bewerten, schlagen wir ein originelles kontrastives Multi-View-Framework vor, das eine explizite Interaktion zwischen Modellen während der Trainingsphase induziert. Wir führen Experimente durch, die verschiedene Strukturen wie Abhängigkeit, Wahlkreis oder sequentielle Schemata kombinieren. Unsere Ergebnisse übertreffen vergleichbare Methoden bei mehreren Aufgaben aus Standard-Satz-Einbettungs-Benchmarks.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza njia ya kudhibiti mwenyewe inayojenga hukumu inayoingia kutoka katika muunganiko mbalimbali wa muungano wa ushirikiano wa hukumu hiyo. Tunadhani muundo ni muhimu wa kujenga uwakilishi wa kawaida kwa sababu tunategemea hukumu inamaanisha kuwa kazi ya kodi na mambo ya sekunde. Kwa mtazamo huu, tunafikiri kuwa baadhi ya maonesho ya lugha inaweza kubadilishwa vizuri kwa sababu ya kazi au hukumu inayotazama. Kwa hiyo, tunapendekeza kujifunza kazi za uwakilishi binafsi kwa mifumo tofauti ya ushirikiano. Pia, kwa nadharia ya hypothesis, shughuli zote kama hizi zinapaswa kuwa na taarifa tofauti tofauti na kwa hiyo, ziwe mgumu kwa kujenga maeneo mazuri ya kisiasa. To assess such hypothesis, we propose an original contrastive multi-view framework that induces an explicit interaction between models during the training phase.  Tunafanya majaribio yanayounganisha miundombinu mbalimbali kama vile kutegemea, utawala, au mipango ya baadae. Matokeo yetu yanafanya mbinu zinazofanana na kazi kadhaa kutoka kwenye hukumu ya msingi zinazoingiza misingi.', 'tr': 'Biz özüni gözleýän bir yöntem teklip edip, sözleriň dürli görnüşinden sözleriň içine girişini saýlaýar. Biz diýip pikir edip otyrýarys, sözlem hem syntaks hem semantik aspektleriň bir funksiýasy bolmagyny gözden ýörän çözümleri gurmak üçin örän möhüm diýip pikir edýäris. Bu perspektivde, biz kellämiz lingwistiki temsilleri düşünen işe ya da sözlem üçin gowy uygulanabilir diýip pikir edip bilýäris. Şol sebäpli biz beýleki sintaktik çarşamlar üçin fokuslary öwrenmegi teklif ediyoruz. Täzeden, hipotezyýa görä, hemme şeýle fonksiýalaryň be ýleki semantik maglumatyny daýlamalydyr we soňra, sözleri semantik daýlamalydyr. Böyle hypotoziýany çözmek üçin, biz özüniň üstüne örän kontrast bir multi-görnüş çerçevesini tassyklaýarys we bu şekilde örän modalaryň arasynda aşyk bir etkileşim töredir. Biz daşarylygyny, meýdançalygyny ýa-da daşarylygyny bir aralygy bilen birleştirip barýarys. Biziň netijelerimiz standart sözleriň içinden birnäçe görnüşli yönlerden çykar.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n self-superviseerde metode wat buit setinge inbettings van die kombinasie van verskillende eksklusiese sintaktieke strukture van 'n seting. Ons aanvaar struktuur is crucial om konsistente voorstellings te bou as ons verwag seting beteken om 'n funksie van beide sintaks en semantiese aspekte te wees. In hierdie perspektief, ons hipotesis dat sommige lingwisiese voorstellings beter aangepas kan word gegee het die aangeneem taak of seting. Ons, daarom, voorstel om individuele voorstelling funksies te leer vir verskillende sintaktieke raamwerke saamstig. Weer, deur hipotees, moet alle sodanige funksies soortgelyke semantiese inligting anders kodeer en daarna, komplementaar wees vir beter sentensiele semantiese inbêding te bou. Om sodanige hipotesis te assesseer, voorstel ons 'n oorspronklike kontrastiewe multi-besigtig raamwerk wat 'n eksplisiese interaksie tussen modele gedurende die oefening fase induseer. Ons maak eksperimente wat verskillende strukture kombinieer soos afhanklikheid, konstituency of sekwensiele skeme. Ons resultate uitvoer vergelykbare metodes op verskeie opdragte van standaard seting inbeter benchmarke.", 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një metodë vetë-mbikqyrure që ndërton përfshirje fjalësh nga kombinimi i strukturave të ndryshme sintaktike të një fjalie. Ne supozojmë se struktura është vendimtare për ndërtimin e përfaqësimeve të vazhdueshme pasi presim që fjala të thotë të jetë një funksion si sintakse ashtu edhe aspekte semantike. Në këtë perspektivë, ne hipotezim se disa përfaqësime gjuhësore mund të përshtaten më mirë duke marrë parasysh detyrën apo fjalën e konsideruar. Prandaj, ne propozojmë të mësojmë funksione përfaqësuese individuale për korniza të ndryshme sintaktike së bashku. Përsëri, nga hipoteza, të gjitha funksionet e tilla duhet të kodojnë informacion semantik të ngjashëm në mënyrë të ndryshme dhe si pasojë, të jetë komplementare për ndërtimin e përfshirjeve më të mira semantike. To assess such hypothesis, we propose an original contrastive multi-view framework that induces an explicit interaction between models during the training phase.  Ne bëjmë eksperimente duke kombinuar struktura të ndryshme të tilla si varësia, rrethina zgjedhore apo skema sekuencore. Rezultatet tona tejkalojnë metodat e krahasueshme në disa detyra nga fjalët standarte që përfshijnë parametra referuese.', 'am': 'የፍርድ ግንኙነት ከልዩ ልዩ ተቃውሞ የተሰናከረውን የግንኙነት አካባቢ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የመሠረት ግንኙነት እና የሲንካስክ ጉዳይ እንዲሆን የምናስበው ግንኙነት የስናክስ እና የስሜት ጉዳይ እንዲሆን መሥራት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ምሳሌ አንዳንዶች የቋንቋዊ መልዕክቶች በተወሰነ ሥራ ወይም ፍርድ እንዲሻል እናስባለን፡፡ እንግዲህ ለልዩ ልዩ ተሳታፊ ክፍተቶችን እናስተማር ዘንድ እናስባለን፡፡ ደግሞም፣ በhypothesis፣ ይህ ዓይነት ሥራ ሁሉ የተለየ የsemantic መረጃን እንዲለየው ይችላል፣ ከዚያም በኋላ የተሻለ ስሜናዊ ሰሜንቲክ አካባቢ ለመሥራት ተደጋጋሚ ይሁን፡፡ እንደዚህ ያሉትን ንፍቅና ለማሳየት፣ በተስተማሪው ደረጃዎች መካከል በሞዴሎቹ መካከል ግንኙነት የሚያሳውቅ የመጀመሪያውን ተቃዋሚ የብዙ ዓይነት ፍሬም እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተመሳሳይ፣ ባሕላዊ፣ ወይም በኋላው ያሉትን የሥርዓተ ሥርዓቶች እናሳስባለን፡፡ ፍሬዎቻችን ከስርዓት ውይይት በሚያሳየው ብሔራዊ ግንኙነት ላይ የሚተያያየው ሥርዓት ነው።', 'fa': 'ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش تحت نظر خودم که از ترکیب ساختارهای ساختاری متفاوتی از جمله\u200cهای مجموعه\u200cای از یک جمله ساخته می\u200cشود. ما فکر می\u200cکنیم ساختار برای ساختن نمایش\u200cهای هماهنگی مهم است، همانطور که انتظار داریم که جمله معنی یک عملکرد هر دو از نقطه\u200cهای سنتاکس و هماهنگی باشد. در این دیدگاه، ما فرض می کنیم که بعضی نمایش\u200cدهندگان زبان\u200cشناسی ممکن است با توجه به وظیفه یا جمله\u200cای که به نظر می\u200cآید بهتر adapt شود. ما به همین دلیل پیشنهاد می کنیم که عملکرد نمایش فردی را برای فرم\u200cهای سنتاکتیک متفاوت یاد بگیریم. دوباره، با فرضیه، تمام این عملکرد باید اطلاعات semantic شبیه\u200cای را متفاوت و به نتیجه، برای ساختن ابتدایی\u200cهای semantic بهتر از احساسات پیدا کنند. برای ارزیابی این فرضیه، ما یک چهارچوب متفاوت متفاوت اصلی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که در طول مرحله آموزش یک تعامل مشخص بین مدل\u200cها تولید می\u200cکند. ما آزمایش\u200cهایی می\u200cکنیم که با ساختارهای مختلف مثل بستگی، محیطی یا نقشه\u200cهای بعدی ترکیب می\u200cکنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای ما روش\u200cهای مقایسه\u200cکننده\u200cای بر چند کار از جمله\u200cهای استاندارد که نشانه\u200cهای استاندارد وارد می\u200cشوند انجام می\u200cدهند.', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք ինքնավերահսկվող մեթոդ, որը կառուցում է նախադասությունների ներդրումներ նախադասության բազմազան բացահայտ սինտակտիկ կառուցվածքների համադրությունից: Մենք ենթադրում ենք, որ կառուցվածքը կարևոր է համապատասխանական ներկայացումների կառուցման համար, քանի որ մենք ակնկալում ենք, որ նախադասությունը նշանակում է լինել սինտաքսի և սեմանտիկ ասպեկտների ֆունկցիա Այս տեսանկյունից մենք ենթադրում ենք, որ որոշ լեզվաբանական ներկայացումներ կարող են ավելի լավ հարմարվել հաշվի առնելով վերաբերյալ խնդիրը կամ նախադասությունը: Այսպիսով, մենք առաջարկում ենք միասին սովորել անհատական ներկայացման ֆունկցիաները տարբեր սինտակտիկ շրջանների համար: Կրկին, հիպոթեզի միջոցով, բոլոր նման ֆունկցիաները պետք է տարբեր կերպ կոդավորեն նման սեմանտիկ ինֆորմացիան և հետևաբար, համալրացվում են ավելի լավ նախադասությունների սեմանտիկ ներդրումների կառուցման համար: Այսպիսի հիպոթեզի գնահատելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք սկզբնական հակադրական բազմատեսակ շրջանակ, որը առաջացնում է բացահայտ փոխազդեցություն մոդելների միջև վարժեքի ընթացքում: Մենք փորձեր ենք կատարում, որոնք համադրում են տարբեր կառուցվածքներ, ինչպիսիք են կախվածությունը, ընտրական շրջանները կամ հաջորդականության ծրագրերը: Մեր արդյունքները գերազանցում են համեմատական մեթոդներ մի քանի խնդիրների վրա, որոնք ստանդարտ նախադասություններն են ներառում:', 'bs': 'Predlažemo samopouzdanu metodu koja izgradi uvođenje rečenica iz kombinacije različitih eksplicitih sintaktičkih struktura rečenice. Pretpostavljamo da je struktura ključna za izgradnju konsekventnih predstavljanja jer očekujemo da rečenica znači biti funkcija i sintaksa i semantičnih aspekta. U ovoj perspektivi, pretpostavljamo da bi neki jezički predstavnici mogli biti bolje prilagođeni s obzirom na razmišljanje zadatka ili kaznu. Stoga predlažemo da zajedno naučimo pojedinačne funkcije zastupanja za različite sintaktičke okvire. Ponovo, po hipotezi, sve takve funkcije bi trebale kodirati slične semantičke informacije drugačije i stoga, biti komplementne za izgradnju boljih sentencijalnih semantičkih integracija. Da bismo procijenili takvu hipotezu, predlažemo originalni kontrastni višestruki okvir koji inducira eksplicitnu interakciju između modela tokom faze obuke. Napravimo eksperimente u kombinaciji različitih struktura poput ovisnosti, sastavnosti ili sekvencijskih šema. Naši rezultati iznose usporedbene metode na nekoliko zadataka iz standardne rečenice, uključujući kritike.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি নিজেকে পর্যবেক্ষণ করার পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি যা বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন সিক্টেক্টিক কাঠামো থেকে বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন সিন্ট্যাক আমরা ধারণা করছি যে কাঠামোটি সাধারণ প্রতিনিধিত্ব নির্মাণ করার জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ যেহেতু আমরা আশা করছি যে বাক্যের মানে সিন্ট্যা এই দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিতে আমরা মনে করি যে কিছু ভাষার প্রতিনিধিত্ব বা বিবেচনা করা কাজ বা শাস্তি প্রদান করা হলে ভালো কিছু ভাষায় তাই আমরা প্রস্তাব করি যে আমরা এক সাথে বিভিন্ন সিন্ট্যাকটিক ফ্রেমের জন্য ব্যক্তিগত প্রতিনিধিত্বের কাজ শিখত আবার হিপাইথিসিসের মাধ্যমে এই সমস্ত কার্যকলাপের সেমান্টিক তথ্য অন্য ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভ এই ধরনের হিপাইটসিসের মূল্য দেখার জন্য আমরা একটি মূল বিরোধী বহুভিউ ফ্রেমের প্রস্তাব করছি যা প্রশিক্ষণের সময় মডেলের মধ্যে এক স্পষ্ট প আমরা বিভিন্ন কাঠামো সম্পর্কে পরীক্ষা করি যেমন নির্ভরশীল, বিভিন্ন কাঠামো অথবা পরিকল্পনার সাথে যুক্ত করা। আমাদের ফলাফল বেনম্যার্কের মাধ্যমে বেশ কয়েকটি কাজের উপর তুলনামূলক পদ্ধতি প্রদান করে।', 'ca': "Proposem un mètode auto-supervisat que construeix incorporacions de frases a partir de la combinació de diverses estructures sinàctiques explícites d'una frase. Suposem que l'estructura és crucial per a construir representacions consistents, mentre esperem que la frase sigui una funció dels aspectes sintaxis i semàntics. En aquesta perspectiva, hipòtesim que algunes representacions lingüístices podrien ser millor adaptades tenint en compte la tasca o frase considerada. Per tant, proposem aprendre funcions de representació individual per diferents marcs sinàctics conjuntament. Again, by hypothesis, all such functions should encode similar semantic information differently and consequently, be complementary for building better sentential semantic embeddings.  Per avaluar aquesta hipòtesi, proposem un marc de múltiples vistes contrastiu original que indueix una interacció explícita entre els models durant la fase d'entrenament. Fem experiments combinant diverses estructures com la dependència, el districte electoral o esquemes seqüencials. Els nostres resultats superen els mètodes comparables en diverses tasques a partir de punts de referència de frases estàndard.", 'cs': 'Navrhujeme metodu, která buduje větové vložení z kombinace různých explicitních syntaktických struktur věty. Předpokládáme, že struktura je klíčová pro budování konzistentních reprezentací, protože očekáváme, že význam věty bude funkcí syntaxe i sémantických aspektů. V této perspektivě předpokládáme hypotézu, že některé jazykové reprezentace by mohly být lépe adaptovány vzhledem k uvažovanému úkolu nebo větě. Proto navrhujeme společně naučit se jednotlivé reprezentační funkce pro různé syntaktické rámce. Opět, podle hypotézy by všechny tyto funkce měly kódovat podobné sémantické informace jinak a následně by měly být doplňkové pro budování lepších sententiálních sémantických vložení. Pro posouzení této hypotézy navrhujeme originální kontrastní multi-view rámec, který indukuje explicitní interakci mezi modely během tréninkové fáze. Provádíme experimenty kombinující různé struktury, jako je závislost, volební obvod nebo sekvenční schémata. Naše výsledky překonávají srovnatelné metody u několika úkolů ze standardních vět vkládajících benchmarků.', 'et': 'Pakume välja isejärelevalve meetodi, mis ehitab lause manustamise erinevate süntaktiliste struktuuride kombinatsioonist. Eeldame, et struktuur on järjepidevate esituste ehitamisel ülioluline, sest loodame lause tähendust nii süntaksi kui semantiliste aspektide funktsiooniks. Selles perspektiivis oletame, et mõned keelelised representatsioonid võivad kaalutud ülesannet või lauset arvestades paremini kohandada. Seetõttu teeme ettepaneku õppida ühiselt erinevate süntaktiliste raamistike individuaalseid esindusfunktsioone. Hüpoteesi põhjal peaksid kõik sellised funktsioonid kodeerima sarnast semantilist teavet erinevalt ja seega täiendama paremate sentimentaalsete semantiliste manustamiste loomist. Sellise hüpoteesi hindamiseks pakume välja originaalse kontrastiivse multivaade raamistiku, mis indutseerib mudelite selget interaktsiooni treeningfaasis. Me teeme katseid, mis ühendavad erinevaid struktuure nagu sõltuvus, valimisringkond või järjestikused skeemid. Meie tulemused ületavad võrreldavaid meetodeid mitmete ülesannete puhul alates standardlause manustamise võrdlusnäitajatest.', 'az': 'Biz özünüzü təmin edirik ki, cümlənin müxtəlif sintaktik yapılarının birləşdirilməsindən sözləri inşa edir. Biz düşünürük ki, cümlənin sintaks və semantik aspektlərin funksiyası olmasını gözləyirik. Bu perspektivdə, bazı dil göstəricilərinin daha yaxşısını düşündüyünüz işlər və cümlələrə görə daha yaxşı uyğunlaşdırılmasını iddia edirik. Beləliklə, biz individual göstəriş funksiyalarını birlikdə müxtəlif sintaktik frameworklar üçün öyrənmək üçün təklif edirik. Bütün bu funksiyalar kimi semantik məlumatları başqası ilə kodlamalıdır və buna görə də daha yaxşı sentencial semantik inşalları inşa etmək üçün daha yaxşıdır. Bu hipotezi değerləşdirmək üçün, təhsil fəzində modellərin arasında açıq-aydın bir müxtəlif çoxlu görünüş framework ünü təklif edirik. Biz müxtəlif yapıları birləşdiririk, bağımlılıq, müəyyənləşdirilmək və ya sonrakı şəkillər kimi. Bizim sonuçlarımız standart cümlənin benchmarklərini daxil edən bir neçə işlər ilə müqayisədə müqayisədə istifadə edilən metodların üstündür.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme itsevalvottua menetelmää, joka rakentaa lauseen upotuksia lauseen erilaisten eksplisiittisten syntaktisten rakenteiden yhdistelmästä. Oletamme, että rakenne on ratkaisevan tärkeää johdonmukaisten esitysten rakentamisessa, koska odotamme lauseen merkityksen olevan sekä syntaksin että semanttisten näkökohtien funktio. Tässä perspektiivissä otaksumme, että jotkin kielelliset representaatiot saattaisivat sopeutua paremmin harkittuun tehtävään tai lauseeseen nähden. Siksi ehdotamme, että oppisimme yhdessä eri syntaktisille kehyksille yksilöllisiä representaatiofunktioita. Taas hypoteesin mukaan kaikkien tällaisten toimintojen pitäisi koodata samankaltaista semanttista tietoa eri tavalla ja näin ollen täydentää parempien sentiaalisten semanttisten upotusten rakentamista. Tämän hypoteesin arvioimiseksi ehdotamme alkuperäistä kontrastiivista moninäkymäkehystä, joka indusoi mallien välisen vuorovaikutuksen koulutusvaiheessa. Teemme kokeiluja, joissa yhdistyvät erilaisia rakenteita kuten riippuvuus, vaalipiiri tai peräkkäiset suunnitelmat. Tuloksemme ylittävät vertailukelpoiset menetelmät useissa tehtävissä vakiolauseiden upottamisen vertailuarvoista.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé ngerasai sistem sing sampeyan nguasai nggawe barang seneng dibutuhke sing dibutungan winih sing dibutungan winih Awak dhéwé yaakaar seneng nggawe wigatining cah-wigatining nggawe nguasah dumadhi kita awak dhéwé seneng kabèh dumadhining sistem sing gawe nguasah seneng sampek karo sematik lan sematik. Nanging perspekteman iki, kita supotesi ngerti tindang batasan languangka luwih apik nyeanyar nggawe barang nggawe winih apa winih. Awak dhéwé, nggunakake karo mulai nggawe barang seneng pisan-pakan karo sinaksi ulih dumadhi. Nambah, nggo ipotes, kabèh saben saiki funksi kudu kode sematik informasi sing mengko karo akeh sematik lan sematik, bisa supomontar kanggo nggawe gambar kelas sematik sing luwih apik. Ngawe kuwi nggunakake suputeksi sing apik, kita supoyo akeh contrast multi-view nggawe nguasai perusahaan interaksi gar model nang takaraning phase kuwi wis ana. Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk nggawe sistem sing kalalah, kayané diputasane, lan akeh-scheme sing berarti. Reject', 'sk': 'Predlagamo samonadzorovano metodo, ki gradi vdelave stavkov iz kombinacije različnih eksplicitnih sintaktičnih struktur stavka. Predvidevamo, da je struktura ključnega pomena za gradnjo doslednih reprezentacij, saj pričakujemo, da bo pomen stavka funkcija sintakse in semantičnih vidikov. V tej perspektivi postavljamo hipotezo, da bi bile nekatere jezikovne reprezentacije glede na obravnavano nalogo ali stavek bolje prilagojene. Zato predlagamo, da se skupaj naučimo individualnih funkcij reprezentacije za različne sintaktične okvire. Ponovno bi morale vse take funkcije po hipotezi drugače kodirati podobne semantične informacije in posledično dopolnjevati gradnjo boljših sententialnih semantičnih vdelav. Za oceno take hipoteze predlagamo izvirni kontrastni multipogledni okvir, ki med fazo usposabljanja spodbuja eksplicitno interakcijo med modeli. Izvajamo poskuse, ki združujejo različne strukture, kot so odvisnost, volilno okrožje ali zaporedne sheme. Naši rezultati presegajo primerljive metode pri več opravilih iz standardnih referenčnih vrednosti vključevanja stavkov.', 'ha': "Munã buɗa wani hanyor masu tsaro da kansa, wanda ke samar da cewa wanda ke shiga cikin shi daga koma da bakin tsaro-takis masu bayyani na dabam-dabam. Tuna yi zaton, bakin na muhimu zuwa ka sami misãlai masu daidai kamar yadda muna ƙayyade maganar da za'a zama wani aikin synkassi da bakin na semantiki. Ga wannan da ke gane, munã munã labanci da cewa wasu misalin harshen, za'a iya zama mafi alhẽri a cika aikin da aka ƙaddara shi. Kayya, ko da haka, sai ka buɗa mu karanta functionin halartawa guda wa firam masu dabam na haɗi. Kayya, dukkan wannan functionin ya kamata a kode mace mai daidaita na semantiki a rarraba dabam, kuma a bayan haka, ya zama mai kamfata wa ka sami tsari da sauri na sauri na semantic. To, domin ka yi qiymi ga wannan teori, Munã goyyar da wani firam na farko mai motsi da multi-vieni wanda ke ƙara wata interaction mai bayyanãwa a tsakanin misãlai during fassarar mafarin. Mu sami jarrabãwa da su sami-komai masu bakwai kamar bakwai, bakwai, ko bakwai. MataimakinMu na sami hanyoyinMu masu daidaita a kan wasu aikin da aka samu da kayan aiki daga matsayin da ke cikin bangon ayuka.", 'he': 'We propose a self-supervised method that builds sentence embeddings from the combination of diverse explicit syntactic structures of a sentence.  אנו מניחים שהמבנה הוא קריטי לבניין מייצגים קבועים כפי שאנחנו מצפים משפט משמעות להיות תפקיד גם של היבטים סינטקסיים וגם סמנטיים. בפרספקטיבה הזאת, אנו מניחים שכמה מייצגים שפתיים עלולים להיות מתאימים יותר בהתחשב במשימה או משפט הנחשבים. אנחנו, לכן, מציעים ללמוד פונקציות מייצג אישיות למסגרות סינטקטיות שונות ביחד. שוב, על ידי היפותזיה, כל תפקידים כאלה צריכים לקוד מידע סמנטי דומה בצורה שונה ובתוצאה מכך, להיות תוספים לבניית תוספות סמנטיות משפטיות טובות יותר. כדי להעריך היפותזיה כזו, אנו מציעים מסגרת נוגדת מקורית ממספר מבט שמגיעה אינטראקציה ברורה בין דוגמנים במהלך שלב האימון. אנחנו עושים ניסויים שילובים מבנים שונים כמו תלויה, מחוז הבחירות או תכניות רצופיות. התוצאות שלנו מעליפות שיטות שוויות על מספר משימות ממשפט סטנדרטי שמכיל רמזים.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ལྟ་བུའི་ལམ་ལུགས་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ཚིག་གི་སྒྲིག་ཕྱོགས་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་རིགས་ཚོགས་ལས་ཨ་རིགས་སྒྲིག་གཏོང་གི་སྒྲི ང་ཚོས་རྩིས་གཞི་འདི་ལ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས་ང་ཚོས་ཚིག་གིས་གསལ་རྩོམ་པ་ཞིག་ཏུ་འཇུག་རྒྱུ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་མཐོང་སྣང་འདིའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་གསལ་བཤད་པ་ཤས་ཆེན་ཡིན་ན་སྐྱེས་པ་དང་ཚིག་རྩིས་ཀྱི་ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་དབུས་གཞུང་ཕྱོགས་སྒྲིག་ནང་གི་ལས་སྒེར་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་སྟོན་པའི་ལས་འཆར་འདོད་ཡོད། Again, by hypothesis, all such functions should encode similar semantic information differently and consequently, be complementary for building better sentential semantic embeddings. འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་གྲངས་སྐོར་དང་ངེད་ཚོས་ཐོག་མའི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་སྣ་མཐུན་གྲངས་ཀ་དེ་སྟོན་པའི་མཐུན་སྣ་ཚོགས་དང་མཐུན ང་ཚོས་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་དང་། སྒྲིག་ཆ་མཐོང་དང་། མ་འོང་བའི་ལས་འཆར་གཞུང་ལ་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ལས་འཆར་བརྟན་པར། ང་ཚོའི་འབྲས་བུ'}
{'en': 'Discrete Reasoning Templates for Natural Language Understanding', 'ar': 'قوالب المنطق المنفصل لفهم اللغة الطبيعية', 'pt': 'Modelos de raciocínio discreto para compreensão de linguagem natural', 'fr': 'Modèles de raisonnement discrets pour la compréhension du langage naturel', 'es': 'Plantillas de razonamiento discreto para la comprensión del lenguaje natural', 'ja': '自然言語を理解するための個別の推論テンプレート', 'zh': '用自然语言解离推理模板', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक भाषा समझ के लिए असतत तर्क टेम्पलेट्स', 'ru': 'Шаблоны дискретного мышления для понимания естественного языка', 'ga': 'Teimpléid Réasúnuithe Scoite chun Teanga Nádúrtha a Thuiscint', 'hu': 'Diszkrét indokolási sablonok a természetes nyelv megértéséhez', 'it': 'Modelli di ragionamento discreto per la comprensione del linguaggio naturale', 'kk': 'Табиғи тілді түсіну үшін дискретті түсіну үлгілері', 'el': 'Πρότυπα διακριτικής αιτιολογίας για την κατανόηση της φυσικής γλώσσας', 'ka': 'Name', 'lt': 'Diskretūs gamtos kalbos supratimo pagrindimo šablonai', 'mk': 'Дискретни причини за разбирање на природниот јазик', 'ms': 'Discrete Reasoning Templates for Natural Language Understanding', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവ ഭാഷയ്ക്കുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d വെട്ടിമാറ്റുക', 'mt': 'Templati ta’ Raġunar Diskreti għall-Ftehim tal-Lingwi Naturali', 'pl': 'Szablony dyskretnego uzasadnienia dla zrozumienia języka naturalnego', 'no': 'Diskrete grunnslar for naturspråk forståking', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл ойлгохын тулд дискрет шалтгаан шалтгаан үлгэр', 'so': 'Heshiiska daryeelka afka asalka ah', 'sr': 'Discrete Reasoning Templates for Natural Language Understanding', 'si': 'ස්වභාවික භාෂාව තේරුම්ගන්න විශේෂ හේතුවක් තේරුම්ගය', 'ro': 'Șabloane de raționare discrete pentru înțelegerea limbajului natural', 'sv': 'Diskreta motiveringsmallar för förståelse av naturligt språk', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழிக்கான வார்ப்புருவை புரிந்து கொள்ளும் வார்ப்புருவை நீக்கு', 'ur': 'طبیعی زبان سمجھنے کے لئے دیسکریٹ ریسونینگ ٹیپلٹ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'da': 'Diskrete begrundelsesskabeloner til forståelse af naturligt sprog', 'hr': 'Discrete Reasoning Templates for Natural Language Understanding', 'nl': 'Discrete redeneringssjablonen voor het begrijpen van natuurlijke taal', 'bg': 'Дискретни шаблони за разбиране на естествения език', 'id': 'Discrete Reasoning Templates for Natural Language Understanding', 'de': 'Diskrete Begründungsvorlagen für das Verstehen natürlicher Sprache', 'fa': 'نمونه\u200cهای دلیل جدی برای فهمیدن زبان طبیعی', 'ko': '자연 언어 이해에 사용되는 이산 추리 템플릿', 'sw': 'Kuondoa Nyumba za Kuratibu Lugha ya asili', 'tr': 'Natal Diller düşünmek üçin diskrete Reaksyon Şablonlar', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'ምስሉን በሌላ ስም አስቀምጥ', 'hy': 'Բնական լեզվի հասկանալու համար բացատրված պատճառման ձևերը', 'az': 'Təbiətli Dil anlama üçün Diskrete Reason Şablonlar', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার বুঝতে পারার জন্য প্রাকৃতিক মন্দির বিচ্ছিন্ন করুন', 'ca': 'Models de raonament discrets per entendre la llengua natural', 'bs': 'Discrete Reasoning Templates for Natural Language Understanding', 'cs': 'Diskrétní odůvodnění šablony pro porozumění přirozenému jazyku', 'et': 'Diskreetsed põhjendusmallid loodusliku keele mõistmiseks', 'fi': 'Erilliset päättelymallit luonnollisen kielen ymmärtämiseen', 'sq': 'Modele arsyetimi diskret për kuptimin e gjuhës natyrore', 'he': 'דוגמאות הגיון דיסקרטיות להבנה של שפה טבעית', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Diskretne predloge za razumevanje naravnega jezika', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་ནུས་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་བའི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས', 'jv': 'Diskrip Tarjamahan kanggo kelangan langkung sapa batar'}
{'en': 'Reasoning about information from multiple parts of a passage to derive an answer is an open challenge for reading-comprehension models. In this paper, we present an approach that reasons about complex questions by decomposing them to simpler subquestions that can take advantage of single-span extraction reading-comprehension models, and derives the final answer according to instructions in a predefined reasoning template. We focus on subtraction based arithmetic questions and evaluate our approach on a subset of the DROP dataset. We show that our approach is competitive with the state of the art while being interpretable and requires little supervision.', 'fr': "Raisonner sur des informations provenant de plusieurs parties d'un passage pour obtenir une réponse est un défi ouvert pour les modèles de compréhension de lecture. Dans cet article, nous présentons une approche qui raisonne des questions complexes en les décomposant en sous-questions plus simples qui peuvent tirer parti des modèles de lecture-compréhension d'extraction à une seule plage, et qui dérive la réponse finale selon les instructions d'un modèle de raisonnement prédéfini. Nous nous concentrons sur les questions arithmétiques basées sur la soustraction et évaluons notre approche sur un sous-ensemble du jeu de données DROP. Nous montrons que notre approche est compétitive avec l'état de l'art tout en étant interprétable et nécessite peu de supervision.", 'ar': 'يعد التفكير في المعلومات من أجزاء متعددة من المقطع لاستنباط إجابة تحديًا مفتوحًا لنماذج القراءة والفهم. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم مقاربة توضح الأسئلة المعقدة عن طريق تحليلها إلى أسئلة فرعية أبسط يمكن أن تستفيد من نماذج الاستخلاص والفهم القرائي ذات الامتداد الفردي ، واستنباط الإجابة النهائية وفقًا للتعليمات في نموذج تفكير محدد مسبقًا. نحن نركز على الأسئلة الحسابية القائمة على الطرح ونقيم نهجنا على مجموعة فرعية من مجموعة بيانات DROP. نظهر أن نهجنا تنافسي مع أحدث ما توصل إليه العلم في حين أنه قابل للتفسير ولا يتطلب سوى القليل من الإشراف.', 'pt': 'Raciocinar sobre informações de várias partes de uma passagem para obter uma resposta é um desafio aberto para os modelos de compreensão de leitura. Neste artigo, apresentamos uma abordagem que raciocina sobre questões complexas, decompondo-as em subquestões mais simples que podem tirar proveito de modelos de leitura-compreensão de extração de intervalo único e deriva a resposta final de acordo com instruções em um modelo de raciocínio predefinido. Nós nos concentramos em questões aritméticas baseadas em subtração e avaliamos nossa abordagem em um subconjunto do conjunto de dados DROP. Mostramos que nossa abordagem é competitiva com o estado da arte ao mesmo tempo em que é interpretável e requer pouca supervisão.', 'es': 'Razonar sobre la información de múltiples partes de un pasaje para derivar una respuesta es un desafío abierto para los modelos de comprensión lectora. En este artículo, presentamos un enfoque que razona sobre preguntas complejas al descomponerlas en subpreguntas más simples que pueden aprovechar los modelos de comprensión lectora de extracción de un solo intervalo, y deriva la respuesta final de acuerdo con las instrucciones en una plantilla de razonamiento predefinida. Nos centramos en las preguntas aritméticas basadas en la resta y evaluamos nuestro enfoque en un subconjunto del conjunto de datos DROP. Demostramos que nuestro enfoque es competitivo con el estado del arte, a la vez que es interpretable y requiere poca supervisión.', 'ja': '答えを導き出すために、一節の複数の部分から情報を推論することは、読解モデルにとってオープンな課題です。本稿では，複雑な疑問について，単一スパン抽出の読み取り理解モデルを活用できるより単純なサブ質問に分解することでその理由を明らかにし，事前定義された推論テンプレートの指示に従って最終的な答えを導き出すアプローチを提示する．減算に基づく算術的な質問に焦点を当て、ドロップデータセットのサブセットに関するアプローチを評価します。私たちのアプローチは、解釈可能でありながら最先端のものと競合し、ほとんど監督を必要としないことを示しています。', 'zh': '推理自段落多信息以得对案,于读解模为一开。 本文有一法,以杂问为更简子推理复杂,可以单跨度提读解模,并据预定义推理模板中推导出终对案。 注于减法之术,以DROP数集子集评之。 吾法与最先进之术竞,兼有可解释性,几不须督。', 'hi': 'एक उत्तर प्राप्त करने के लिए एक मार्ग के कई हिस्सों से जानकारी के बारे में तर्क पढ़ना-समझ मॉडल के लिए एक खुली चुनौती है। इस पेपर में, हम एक दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो जटिल प्रश्नों के बारे में कारण है, उन्हें सरल उप-प्रश्नों के लिए विघटित करके जो एकल-अवधि निष्कर्षण पढ़ने-समझ मॉडल का लाभ उठा सकते हैं, और एक पूर्वनिर्धारित तर्क टेम्पलेट में निर्देशों के अनुसार अंतिम उत्तर प्राप्त करते हैं। हम घटाव आधारित अंकगणितीय प्रश्नों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं और ड्रॉप डेटासेट के सबसेट पर हमारे दृष्टिकोण का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण कला की स्थिति के साथ प्रतिस्पर्धी है, जबकि व्याख्या योग्य है और इसके लिए बहुत कम पर्यवेक्षण की आवश्यकता होती है।', 'ru': 'Обоснование информации из нескольких частей отрывка, чтобы получить ответ, является открытым вызовом для моделей чтения-понимания. В этой статье мы представляем подход, который обосновывает сложные вопросы, декомпозируя их на более простые подвопросы, которые могут воспользоваться преимуществами моделей чтения-понимания с однопролетной экстракцией, и выводит окончательный ответ в соответствии с инструкциями в предопределенном шаблоне рассуждений. Мы фокусируемся на арифметических вопросах, основанных на вычитании, и оцениваем наш подход на подмножестве ПАДАЮЩЕГО набора данных. Мы показываем, что наш подход конкурирует с современным уровнем развития, хотя и является интерпретируемым и требует незначительного контроля.', 'ga': 'Dúshlán oscailte do mhúnlaí léamhthuisceana é réasúnaíocht a dhéanamh faoi fhaisnéis ó chodanna iolracha de phíosa chun freagra a fháil. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair cur chuige a dhéanann cúiseanna le ceisteanna casta trí iad a dhianscaoileadh go focheisteanna níos simplí ar féidir leas a bhaint as samhlacha léamhthuisceana aon-réise asbhainte, agus a fhaigheann an freagra deiridh de réir treoracha i dteimpléad réasúnaíochta réamhshainithe. Dírímid ar cheisteanna uimhríochta atá bunaithe ar dhealú agus luachálaimid ár gcur chuige ar fho-thacar de thacar sonraí DROP. Léirímid go bhfuil ár gcur chuige iomaíoch leis an úrscothacht cé gur féidir é a léirmhíniú agus gur beag maoirseacht a theastaíonn.', 'ka': 'შესაძლებელია გახსნა მრავალ ნაწილიდან ინფორმაციის გამოსახულება განხორციელი გამოსახულება კითხვის შესაძლებელი მოდელებისთვის. ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ პროგრამა, რომელიც კომპლექციური კითხვების მიზეზები, რომლებიც შეგვიძლია გამოიყენება ერთეულ ექსპექციის კითხვების მოდელების გამოყენება, და შეგვიძლია დასაწყება ინსტ ჩვენ არიტემეტიკური კითხვების გამოკლებისთვის ფონსკურებულია და ჩვენი მიღება DROP მონაცემების სექსეტისთვის გავამუშავებთ. ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ჩვენი წარმოდგენა კონკურეტიურია მსგავსი სტატის სტატისთან, როცა უნდა იყოს გარგებელი და უნდა მალკი დანარჩენ', 'hu': 'Az olvasás-értési modellek számára nyílt kihívást jelent az olvasás-értési modellek több részéből származó információkra vonatkozó érvelés. Ebben a tanulmányban olyan megközelítést mutatunk be, amely komplex kérdéseket indokol, egyszerűbb alkérdésekre bontva, amelyek kihasználhatják az egyszintes extrakciós olvasási-értési modelleket, és a végső választ egy előre meghatározott érvelési sablon utasításai szerint származtatja. A kivonáson alapuló számtani kérdésekre összpontosítunk, és a DROP adatkészlet egy részhalmazán értékeljük a megközelítésünket. Megmutatjuk, hogy megközelítésünk versenyképes a legkorszerűbb technológiával, ugyanakkor értelmezhető és kevés felügyeletet igényel.', 'el': 'Ο συλλογισμός πληροφοριών από πολλαπλά μέρη ενός αποσπάσματος για την εξαγωγή μιας απάντησης αποτελεί μια ανοικτή πρόκληση για μοντέλα ανάγνωσης-κατανόησης. Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια προσέγγιση που αιτιολογεί πολύπλοκες ερωτήσεις αποσυντίθεται σε απλούστερες υποερωτήσεις που μπορούν να επωφεληθούν από μοντέλα ανάγνωσης-κατανόησης εξαγωγής ενός διαστήματος, και αντλεί την τελική απάντηση σύμφωνα με οδηγίες σε ένα προκαθορισμένο πρότυπο συλλογισμού. Εστιάζουμε σε αριθμητικά ερωτήματα με βάση την αφαίρεση και αξιολογούμε την προσέγγισή μας σε ένα υποσύνολο του συνόλου δεδομένων. Δείχνουμε ότι η προσέγγισή μας είναι ανταγωνιστική με την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας ενώ είναι ερμηνευτική και απαιτεί ελάχιστη εποπτεία.', 'it': "Ragionare sulle informazioni da più parti di un passaggio per ricavare una risposta è una sfida aperta per i modelli di lettura-comprensione. In questo articolo, presentiamo un approccio che ragiona su domande complesse scomponendole in sottodomande più semplici che possono trarre vantaggio da modelli di lettura-comprensione a estrazione singola, e deriva la risposta finale secondo le istruzioni in un modello di ragionamento predefinito. Ci concentriamo sulle domande aritmetiche basate sulla sottrazione e valutiamo il nostro approccio su un sottoinsieme del set di dati DROP. Dimostriamo che il nostro approccio è competitivo con lo stato dell'arte pur essendo interpretabile e richiede poca supervisione.", 'kk': 'Жауап беру үшін бірнеше бөліктерден мәлімет туралы мәліметті түсіну үшін ашық шақыру - оқу- түсініктеме үлгілері үшін. Бұл қағазда, біз комплекс сұрақтардың себептерін бір-бірінші кеңістік оқу үлгілерінің артықшылығына артықшылық түсіну үлгілерінің артықшылығын келтіріп, алдыңғы кеңістік үлгілерінің мәліметтеріне сә Біз арифметикалық сұрақтарды алып тастап, DROP деректер жиынының ішкі бөлігіне қатынасыз. Біз өзіміздің тәсіліміміздің орындауға мүмкіндігіміздің күйіне тәртіпсіздігін көрсетуіміз керек және кішкентай қарау керек.', 'mk': 'Разумнувањето за информациите од повеќе делови од преминот за да се добие одговор е отворен предизвик за моделите за читање-разбирање. Во овој документ, претставуваме пристап кој причинува за комплексни прашања преку распоредување на нив на поедноставни подпрашања кои можат да ги искористат моделите за читање-разбирање на екстракција од едно ниво, и го изведува конечниот одговор според инструкциите во преддефинираниот шаблон за размислување. Се фокусираме на артиметичките прашања базирани на отстранување и го проценуваме нашиот пристап на подгрупата на DROP датотеките. Ние покажуваме дека нашиот пристап е конкурентен со современата технологија додека е интерпретабилен и бара малку надзор.', 'ml': 'ഒരു ഉത്തരം ലഭ്യമാക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു പാസ്സേജില്\u200d നിന്നും പല ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കേള്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്നത് വായിക്കുന In this paper, we present an approach that reasons about complex questions by decomposing them to simpler subquestions that can take advantage of single-span extraction reading-comprehension models, and derives the final answer according to instructions in a predefined reasoning template.  നമ്മള്\u200d ആറിത്മീറ്റിക് ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുകയും, ഡിറോപ് ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിന്\u200dറെ ഒരു സബ്ജറില്\u200d നമ്മു ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ സമ്പാദ്യം കലാകാരത്തിന്\u200dറെ സ്ഥിതിയോട് മത്സരിക്കുന്നത് എന്നും, വ്യക്തമാക്കുന', 'ms': 'Alasan mengenai maklumat dari berbagai bahagian laluan untuk mendapatkan jawapan adalah cabaran terbuka untuk model pembacaan-pemahaman. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan pendekatan yang sebab soalan kompleks dengan memutuskan mereka ke subsoalan yang lebih mudah yang boleh mengambil keuntungan dari model ekstraksi baca-pemahaman jangka tunggal, dan menghasilkan jawapan akhir menurut arahan dalam templat pemahaman terdefinisi. Kita fokus pada soalan aritmetik berdasarkan tolak dan menilai pendekatan kita pada subset set data DROP. Kami menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kami adalah kompetitif dengan keadaan seni semasa boleh diterangkan dan memerlukan sedikit pengawasan.', 'mt': 'Ir-raġuni għall-informazzjoni minn diversi partijiet ta’ passaġġ biex tinkiseb tweġiba hija sfida miftuħa għall-mudelli ta’ qari-komprensjoni. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nippreżentaw approċċ li jirrigwarda mistoqsijiet kumplessi billi niddekomponuhom għal sottomistoqsijiet aktar sempliċi li jistgħu jieħdu vantaġġ minn mudelli ta’ qari u komprensjoni ta’ estrazzjoni b’firxa waħda, u li jirriżultaw mit-tweġiba finali skont struzzjonijiet f’mudell ta’ raġunament predefinit. Aħna niffokaw fuq mistoqsijiet aritmetiċi bbażati fuq it-tnaqqis u nivvalutaw l-approċċ tagħna fuq sottosett tad-dejta DROP. Aħna nuru li l-approċċ tagħna huwa kompetittiv mal-aktar avvanzat filwaqt li huwa interpretabbli u jeħtieġ ftit superviżjoni.', 'no': 'Årsaken om informasjon frå fleire deler av ei passasjon for å få ein svar er eit opna utfordring for lesingsforståkingsmodular. I denne papiret presenterer vi ein tilnærming som grunner om komplekse spørsmål ved å dekomponera dei til enklare underspørsmål som kan bruka utviklingar av enklare utpakkingsmodular for lesing og forståking, og utviklar det siste svaret etter instruksjonar i eit føredefinert underspørsmål. Vi fokuserer på subtraksjonsbaserte aritmetiske spørsmål og evaluerer tilnærminga vårt på ein underdelen av DROP-datasettet. Vi viser at tilnærminga vårt er konkurrentivt med kunststanden mens det er tolkbare og krev liten oversikt.', 'mn': 'Хариултыг олон хэсэгт олон хэсэгт олж мэдээллийн тухай шалтгаан нь унших-ойлголтын загварын тухай нээлттэй сорилт юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид комплекс асуултуудын шалтгаануудыг илүү энгийн суурь асуултуудад хувааж, нэг хэмжээний унших-ойлголтын загварын ашиг ашиглаж чадна. Бид арифметикийн асуултуудыг хасах дээр анхаарлаа хандуулж, DROP өгөгдлийн суурь дээр бидний арифметикийн асуултуудыг үнэлэх хэрэгтэй. Бид урлагийн байдалтай өрсөлдөг гэдгийг харуулж, ойлгомжтой, бага зэрэг харах хэрэгтэй.', 'pl': 'Rozumowanie informacji z wielu części fragmentu w celu uzyskania odpowiedzi jest otwartym wyzwaniem dla modeli rozumienia czytania. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy podejście, które uzasadnia złożone pytania poprzez ich rozkład na prostsze podpytania, które mogą wykorzystać modele ekstrakcji pojedynczego rozpoznania odczytu i wywodzi ostateczną odpowiedź według instrukcji w predefiniowanym szablonie rozumowania. Skupiamy się na pytaniach arytmetycznych opartych na odejmowaniu i oceniamy nasze podejście na podzbiorze danych DROP. Pokazujemy, że nasze podejście jest konkurencyjne z najnowszym stanem techniki, a jednocześnie interpretowalne i wymaga małego nadzoru.', 'lt': 'Atsakymui gauti pagrįsta informacija iš kelių dalių yra atviras iššūkis skaitymo ir supratimo modeliams. Šiame dokumente pristatome požiūrį, kuriuo grindžiami sudėtingi klausimai, išskaičiuojant juos į paprastesnius paklausimus, kurie gali pasinaudoti vienkartinio ekstrahavimo skaitymo ir supratimo modeliais, ir gaunamas galutinis atsakymas pagal iš anksto apibrėžtame motyvavimo šablone pateiktas instrukcijas. We focus on subtraction based arithmetic questions and evaluate our approach on a subset of the DROP dataset.  Mes rodome, kad mūsų požiūris yra konkurencingas su pažangiąja technologija, tačiau yra aiškinamas ir reikalinga maža priežiūra.', 'si': 'පාස් කොටස් වලින් තොරතුරු ගැන ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ලැබෙන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක මේ පත්තරේ අපි පිළිගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ගැන හේතුවක් තියෙන්නේ ඒවා ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්වාස කරලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයකට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් තරම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝ අපි අතිරික්ෂණය අධික ගණික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ DROP දත්ත සෙට් එකේ අපේ අතිරික්ෂණය ගැන බලන්න. අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියන්න පුළුවන් වෙලාවක් තියෙන්නේ කියලා කිය', 'ro': 'Motivarea informațiilor din mai multe părți ale unui pasaj pentru a obține un răspuns este o provocare deschisă pentru modelele de citire-înțelegere. În această lucrare, prezentăm o abordare care argumentează despre întrebări complexe prin descompunerea lor în subîntrebări mai simple, care pot profita de modele de extracție a lecturii-înțelegerii cu o singură span și derivă răspunsul final conform instrucțiunilor într-un șablon de raționament predefinit. Ne concentrăm pe întrebări aritmetice bazate pe scădere și evaluăm abordarea noastră pe un subset al setului de date DROP. Demonstrăm că abordarea noastră este competitivă cu cele mai moderne tehnologii, fiind în același timp interpretabilă și necesită puțină supraveghere.', 'so': "Wixii la xiriira macluumaadka la xiriira kooxo badan oo baasaboor laga helo jawaab waa dhibaato furan tusaalaha wax akhriska. Qoraalkan waxaynu keenaynaa qaab ay ka sababtaa su'aalo adag, si ay u fududaato su'aalo fudud oo ay u isticmaali karto tusaalaha la akhriyo oo hal maalmood ah, waxaana ka helaa jawaabta ugu dambeeya si waafaqsan tilmaamaha hagitaanka ee horay loo qoray. Waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa su'aalaha arithmetic ee ku saleysan, waxaana qiimeynaynaa qaababkayaga koob ka mid ah danbiyada DROP. Waxaynu muujinnaa in dhaqdhaqaalahayagu ay ku adag tahay xaalada farshaxanka marka la turjumo islamarkaasna looga baahan yahay ilaalin yar.", 'sr': 'Razlog o informacijama iz višestrukih dijelova prolaza da bi dobio odgovor je otvoren izazov za modele razumevanja čitanja. U ovom papiru predstavljamo pristup kojim se razlozi o kompleksnim pitanjima raspoređujući ih na jednostavnije podpitanje koje mogu iskoristiti modele razumijevanja jednostruke izvlačenja i proizvesti konačni odgovor prema instrukcijama u predodređenom obrazovanju. Fokusiramo se na pitanja aritmetike na osnovu odvajanja i procenjujemo naš pristup podsetu podataka DROP-a. Pokazujemo da je naš pristup konkurentan sa stanjem umetnosti dok je interpretabilan i zahteva malo nadzora.', 'sv': 'Att resonera kring information från flera delar av en passage för att härleda ett svar är en öppen utmaning för läsförståelse modeller. I denna uppsats presenterar vi ett tillvägagångssätt som resonerar kring komplexa frågor genom att sönderdela dem till enklare underfrågor som kan dra nytta av single-span extraction läsförståelse modeller, och härleder det slutliga svaret enligt instruktioner i en fördefinierad resonemang mall. Vi fokuserar på subtraktionsbaserade aritmetiska frågor och utvärderar vårt tillvägagångssätt på en delmängd av DROP-datauppsättningen. Vi visar att vårt tillvägagångssätt är konkurrenskraftigt med den senaste tekniken samtidigt som det är tolkningsbart och kräver lite tillsyn.', 'ur': 'ایک مسافر کے بہت سی قسموں سے اطلاعات کے بارے میں جواب حاصل کرنے کے لئے ایک کھلی چال ہے کہ پڑھنے-سمجھنے کے موڈل کے لئے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں کہ پیچیدہ سوالوں کے بارے میں دلیل ہیں کہ ان کو آسان زیادہ سوالوں میں تقسیم کریں جو ایک طریقہ کے پڑھنے اور سمجھنے کی مدل سے فائدہ پہنچا سکتے ہیں اور آخری جواب ایک پہلے مقرر ہوئی دلیل کے مطابق پیدا کرتا ہے. ہم گھیرنے کی بنیاد ریٹمیٹیک سؤال پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں اور ہماری طریقہ DROP ڈیٹ سٹ کے سپسٹ پر ارزش کرتے ہیں. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا تقریبا هنر کی حالت کے ساتھ مسابقه ہے حالانکہ یہ تعبیر قابل ہے اور کم نظر کی ضرورت ہے', 'ta': 'கடவுச்செல்லும் பல பகுதிகளிலிருந்து தகவல் பற்றிய படிக்கப்பட்டு பதிலை பெறுவதற்கு திறந்த சவாலாகும். இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் ஒரு சிக்கல் கேள்விகளைப் பற்றி காரணங்களை கொண்டு வருகிறோம் என்று ஒரு சுலபமான துணை கேள்விகளை வெளிப்படுத்துவதற்கு முன்னரே குறிப்பிட் We focus on subtraction based arithmetic questions and evaluate our approach on a subset of the DROP dataset.  We show that our approach is competitive with the state of the art while being interpretable and requires little supervision.', 'vi': 'Lý luận về thông tin từ nhiều phần của đoạn để tìm ra câu trả lời là một thử thách mở cho các mô hình đọc-thấu. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp lý giải về các câu hỏi phức tạp bằng cách phân hủy chúng thành các chi tiết đơn giản, có thể tận dụng các mô hình hiểu thấu độc đáo, và bắt nguồn câu trả lời cuối theo hướng dẫn trong một mẫu lập trình đã xác định trước. Chúng tôi tập trung vào việc trừ những câu hỏi số học dựa trên cộng đồng và đánh giá phương pháp của chúng tôi về một nhóm dữ liệu DROP. Chúng tôi cho thấy phương pháp của chúng tôi cạnh tranh với trạng thái nghệ thuật trong khi được giải thích và đòi hỏi ít sự giám sát.', 'uz': "Name Bu qogʻozda, biz murakkab savollar haqida sabablarni o'zgartirish uchun oddiy tub savollarni o'zgartirish mumkin va bir span tuzilishi modellaridan foydalanishi mumkin va bir necha soʻzni o'qish modellariga ega bo'ladi. Bir qanday ifodalar namunasidagi imkoniyatlarning asosiy javob beradi. Biz arithmetik savollariga murojaat qilamiz va DROP maʼlumotlar tarkibini qiymatimiz. Biz shunday ko'raymiz, bizning fikrimiz rasm holati bilan rivojlanishimiz va o'rganish kerak bo'ladi.", 'bg': 'Разбирането на информацията от множество части на пасаж за извличане на отговор е открито предизвикателство за моделите за четене-разбиране. В настоящата статия представяме подход, който мотивира сложните въпроси, като ги разгражда на по-прости подвъпроси, които могат да се възползват от модели за извличане на четиво-разбиране с единичен обхват, и извлича окончателния отговор съгласно инструкции в предварително определен шаблон за разсъждение. Фокусираме се върху аритметични въпроси въз основа на изваждане и оценяваме подхода си върху поднабор от данни. Показваме, че нашият подход е конкурентен с най-съвременните технологии, като същевременно е разбираем и изисква малко надзор.', 'hr': 'Razlog o informacijama iz višestrukih dijelova prolaza kako bi dobio odgovor je otvoren izazov za modele razumijevanja čitanja. U ovom papiru predstavljamo pristup kojim se razlozi o kompleksnim pitanjima rasključujući ih na jednostavnije podpitanje koje mogu iskoristiti modele razumijevanja jednostruke izvlačenja i proizvesti konačni odgovor u skladu s uputama u predodređenom obrazovanju. Fokusiramo se na pitanja aritmetike na osnovu odvajanja i procijenimo naš pristup na podskupu podataka DROP-a. Pokazujemo da je naš pristup konkurentan s državom umjetnosti dok je interpretabilan i zahtijeva malo nadzora.', 'nl': 'Redenen over informatie uit meerdere delen van een passage om een antwoord af te leiden is een open uitdaging voor leesbegripsmodellen. In dit artikel presenteren we een benadering die redeneert over complexe vragen door ze te ontbinden in eenvoudigere subvragen die gebruik kunnen maken van single-span extraction leesbegripsmodellen, en het uiteindelijke antwoord afleidt volgens instructies in een vooraf gedefinieerde redeneersjabloon. We richten ons op subtractie gebaseerde rekenvragen en evalueren onze aanpak op een subset van de DROP dataset. We laten zien dat onze aanpak concurrerend is met de state of the art terwijl ze interpreteerbaar is en weinig toezicht vereist.', 'da': 'At begrunde oplysninger fra flere dele af en passage for at udlede et svar er en åben udfordring for læseforståelsesmodeller. I denne artikel præsenterer vi en tilgang, der begrunder om komplekse spørgsmål ved at nedbryde dem til enklere underspørgsmål, der kan drage fordel af single-span ekstraktion læse-forståelse modeller, og udleder det endelige svar i henhold til instruktioner i en foruddefineret ræsonnement skabelon. Vi fokuserer på subtraktionsbaserede aritmetiske spørgsmål og evaluerer vores tilgang på en delmængde af DROP datasættet. Vi viser, at vores tilgang er konkurrencedygtig med den nyeste teknologi, samtidig med at den kan fortolkes og kræver ringe tilsyn.', 'de': 'Die Begründung von Informationen aus mehreren Teilen einer Passage, um eine Antwort abzuleiten, ist eine offene Herausforderung für Leseverständnismodelle. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir einen Ansatz vor, der komplexe Fragen durch Zerlegung in einfachere Unterfragen, die die Vorteile von Single-Span Extraktion Leseverständnismodellen nutzen können, begründet und die endgültige Antwort gemäß Anweisungen in einer vordefinierten Argumentationsvorlage ableitet. Wir konzentrieren uns auf subtraktionsbasierte arithmetische Fragen und evaluieren unseren Ansatz auf einer Teilmenge des DROP-Datensatzes. Wir zeigen, dass unser Ansatz mit dem Stand der Technik konkurriert, interpretierbar ist und wenig Aufsicht erfordert.', 'ko': '읽기 이해 모델에 있어 문장의 여러 부분의 정보를 추리하여 답을 얻는 것은 공개적인 도전이다.본고에서 우리는 복잡한 문제를 더욱 간단한 서브문제로 분해하고 단일 추출 읽기 이해 모델을 이용하여 추리를 하고 미리 정의된 추리 템플릿의 설명에 따라 최종 답안을 얻어내는 방법을 제시했다.우리는 뺄셈 기반 산술 문제에 주목하고 DROP 데이터 세트의 서브셋에서 우리의 방법을 평가합니다.우리는 우리의 방법이 가장 선진적인 기술과 경쟁하는 동시에 해석성이 있고 감독이 거의 필요 없다는 것을 보여준다.', 'fa': 'Reason for information from multiple parts of a passage to derive a answer is an open challenge for reading-comprehension models. در این کاغذ، ما یک روش را نشان می دهیم که دلایل درباره سوالات پیچیده با تقسیم کردن آنها به زیر سوالات ساده\u200cتری که می\u200cتوانند از مدل\u200cهای درک خواندن و درک کردن یک منطقه استفاده کنند، و پایان نهایی را بر اساس دستورات\u200cهای یک قالب دلیل پیش\u200cفرض می\u200cکند. ما تمرکز می کنیم روی سوالات عدد بنیاد گرفتن و روش ما را روی یک زیر مجموعه داده\u200cهای DROP ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم. ما نشان می دهیم که دسترسی ما با وضعیت هنر مسابقه است در حالی که قابل تعبیر و نیاز به نظر کوچک است.', 'sw': 'Kusoma taarifa kutoka sehemu mbalimbali za njia ili kupata jibu ni changamoto huru kwa mifano ya kusoma. Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka mbinu ambazo zinasababisha maswali magumu kwa kuzipunguza maswali rahisi ya mambo yanayoweza kutumia matumizi ya mifano ya kusoma moja kwa moja, na inatoa jibu la mwisho kwa mujibu wa maelekezo ya kisasa kwa mujibu wa maelekezo yaliyotanguliwa katika namba ya akili. Tunaweza lengo la kutangazwa kwa maswali ya kiarithmetia na kutathmini hatua yetu katika kandanda ya taarifa za DROP. Tunaonyesha kwamba hatua yetu inashindana na hali ya sanaa wakati wa kutafsiri na inahitaji ufuatiliaji kidogo.', 'tr': 'Cevap çykmak üçin geçişiň birnäçe böleginden maglumat barada düşünmek üçin a çyk kynçylyk däldir. Bu kagyzda biz gaty karmaşık soraglary üçin olaryň ýeke-de bir gezek okama-düşünme nusgalaryndan faydalan bolup bilen esasy soraglaryň sebäplerini çykarýarys we olaryň öňünden belirlenýän düşünme nusgalaryna görä soňky jogabyny çykarýarys. Çykarmak tabanly aritmetik soraglaryna üns berýäris we öz metodamyzy DROP sanynyň bir toparynda deňleýäris. Biziň ýaryşymyz sungatyň durumyna ýaryşylyk bilen ýaryşylykly we kiçi-kiçi üstünlik gerek bolýandygyny görkezýäris.', 'af': "Die rede van inligting van veelvuldige dele van 'n pasmaak om 'n antwoord te aftrek is 'n oop uitdrukking vir lees-verstaan modele. In hierdie papier, ons stel 'n toegang wat redes oor kompleks vrae deur hulle te ontkoppel na eenvoudiger subvrae wat kan voordeel van enkel-span uitpakking lees-verstaan modele neem, en afgelei die eindelike antwoord volgens instruksies in 'n vooraf definieerde rede sjabloon. Ons fokus op aftrekking gebaseerde aritmetiese vrae en evalueer ons toegang op 'n subartikel van die DROP datastel. Ons wys dat ons toegang rekenaar is met die staat van die kuns terwyl dit uitgelaakbaar is en nodig klein supervisie.", 'sq': 'Arsyeja për informacionin nga pjesë të shumta të një pasazhi për të marrë një përgjigje është një sfidë e hapur për modelet e leximit-kuptimit. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një qasje që arsyeton rreth pyetjeve komplekse duke i shkëputur a to në nënpyetje më të thjeshta që mund të përfitojnë nga modelet e leximit-kuptimit të ekstraksionit me një shtresë të vetme, dhe nxjerr përgjigjen përfundimtare sipas udhëzimeve në një modele arsyetimi të paracaktuar. Ne përqëndrohemi në pyetjet aritmetike të bazuara në heqje dhe vlerësojmë qasjen tonë në një nëngrup të të dhënave DROP. Ne tregojmë se qasja jonë është konkurruese me gjendjen e teknologjisë ndërsa është e interpretueshme dhe kërkon pak mbikqyrje.', 'am': 'የመልስ መልስ ለመቀበል በተለያዩ ክፍሎች ላይ የመረጃ ማስረጃ ማቅረብ ለማንበብ-compression models የተከፈተ ጥላቻ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ ስለአካባቢ ጥያቄዎችን ለመቀበል የሚችሉትን ጥያቄዎች አቀላቅሎ ጥያቄ እናቀርባታለን፡፡ አርትሜቲካዊ ጥያቄዎችን በመግለጽ እናሳውቃለን የDROP ዳታተር አካባቢ ጉዳይ ላይ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ እናሳያቸዋለን፤ መተረጉም እና ትንሽ ጉዳይ እንዲያስፈልጋቸው የዐርብ ሥርዓት ተቃዋሚ ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Cevap almaq üçün çoxlu keçənin məlumatları haqqında dəyişdirmək oxumaq-anlama modellərinin a çıq çətinlikdir. Bu kağızda, biz kompleks suallar haqqında səbəblər çəkirik, onları daha basit apar suallara çəkirik ki, tək dəfə oxumaq-anlama modellerindən fayda verə bilər, və əvvəlcə belə bir dəyişiklik şablona görə son cavabı alır. Biz aritmetik suallarını çəkməyə tərəf göstəririk və DROP verilənlərin dəstəsinə tərəf çəkirik. Biz göstəririk ki, bizim yaxınlığımız sanatın vəziyyəti ilə mübahisə edir, yoxsulluq edir və az gözləmə lazımdır.', 'bn': 'একটি উত্তর পাওয়ার জন্য বেশ কয়েকটি অংশ থেকে তথ্য পাওয়া যাচ্ছে তা পড়তে পারে একটি উন্মুক্ত চ্যালেঞ্জ। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি প্রযুক্তি উপস্থাপন করি যা জটিল প্রশ্নের ব্যাপারে কারণ তাদের সাধারণ সাবপ্রশ্নের মাধ্যমে অবমুক্ত করে দেয় যা এক স্প্যানের বেছে নিতে পারে একাধি আমরা আরিথিমিটিক প্রশ্নের উপর মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি এবং ডিরোপ ডাটাসেটের একটি সাবটেটে আমাদের পদক্ষেপ মূল্যায়ন করি। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রের সাথে প্রতিযোগিতায়, যখন ব্যাখ্যা করা হচ্ছে এবং সাম', 'hy': 'Պատասխան ստանալու բազմաթիվ մասերից տեղեկատվության մասին պատճառը բաց մարտահրավեր է կարդալու և հասկանալու մոդելների համար: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի մոտեցում, որը պատճառում է բարդ հարցերի մասին, բաժանելով դրանք պարզ ենթահարցերի, որոնք կարող են օգտագործել կարդալ-հասկանալ մեկ տարբերակի արտահանման մոդելները, և ստանում է վերջնական պատասխանը ըստ նախասահմանված մտածողության մոդելի ցուցադրումների: Մենք կենտրոնանում ենք հանելու հիմնված թվային հարցերի վրա և գնահատում ենք մեր մոտեցումը Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը մրցակցում է տեխնոլոգիայի հետ, մինչ այն մեկնաբանելի է և պահանջում է քիչ վերահսկողություն:', 'bs': 'Razlog o informacijama iz višestrukih dijelova prolaza za otkrivanje odgovora je otvoren izazov za modele razumijevanja čitanja. U ovom papiru predstavljamo pristup kojim se razlozi o kompleksnim pitanjima raspoređujući ih na jednostavnije podpitanje koje mogu iskoristiti modele razumijevanja jednostruke izvlačenja i proizvesti konačni odgovor prema instrukcijama u predodređenom razumnom šablonu. Fokusiramo se na pitanja aritmetike na osnovu odvajanja i procjenjujemo naš pristup podsetu podataka DROP-a. Pokazujemo da je naš pristup konkurentan sa stanjem umjetnosti dok je interpretabilan i zahtijeva malo nadzora.', 'cs': 'Odůvodnění informací z více částí pasáže k odvození odpovědi je otevřenou výzvou pro modely porozumění čtení. V tomto článku představujeme přístup, který uvažuje o složitých otázkách tím, že je rozloží na jednodušší podotázky, které mohou využít jednoduchých extrakčních modelů porozumění čtení a odvozuje konečnou odpověď podle pokynů v předem definované šabloně uvažování. Zaměřujeme se na aritmetické otázky založené na odčítání a hodnotíme náš přístup na podmnožině dat DROP. Ukazujeme, že náš přístup je konkurenceschopný nejmodernějšímu stavu techniky a zároveň interpretovatelný a vyžaduje malý dohled.', 'ca': "Reasonar sobre la informació de múltiples parts d'un passatge per a obtenir una resposta és un repte obert per als models de llegir-entendre. En aquest paper, presentem un enfocament que raona sobre preguntes complexes descomposant-les en subpreguntes més simples que poden aprofitar models de lectura-comprensió d'extracció a una sola escala, i deriva la resposta final segons les instruccions d'un model de raonament predefinit. Ens centrem en les preguntes aritmètiques basades en la subtracció i evaluem el nostre enfocament en un subconjunt del conjunt de dades DROP. We show that our approach is competitive with the state of the art while being interpretable and requires little supervision.", 'et': 'Lõigu mitmest osast pärit teabe põhjendamine vastuse saamiseks on lugemise mõistmise mudelitele avatud väljakutse. Käesolevas töös esitame lähenemisviisi, mis põhjendab keerukaid küsimusi, lagundades need lihtsamateks alamküsimusteks, mis võivad ära kasutada ühe ulatusega ekstraheerimise lugemis-mõistmise mudeleid, ning tuletab lõpliku vastuse vastavalt juhistele eelnevalt määratletud põhjendusmallil. Me keskendume lahutamisel põhinevatele aritmeetilistele küsimustele ja hindame oma lähenemisviisi DROP andmekogumi alamhulgale. Näitame, et meie lähenemisviis on konkurentsivõimeline tehnika tasemega, olles samas tõlgendatav ja nõuab vähe järelevalvet.', 'fi': 'Luku-ymmärtämismallien avoin haaste on ajateltu tietoa kappaleen useista osista vastauksen saamiseksi. Tässä työssä esitellään lähestymistapa, joka perustelee monimutkaisia kysymyksiä hajottamalla ne yksinkertaisemmiksi alakysymyksiksi, jotka voivat hyödyntää yksiulotteisia ekstraktiomalleja ja johtaa lopullisen vastauksen ennalta määritellyn päättelymallin ohjeiden mukaisesti. Keskitymme vähennyksiin perustuviin aritmeettisiin kysymyksiin ja arvioimme lähestymistapaamme DROP-aineiston osajoukkoon. Osoitamme, että lähestymistapamme on kilpailukykyinen nykytekniikan kanssa, mutta se on tulkittavissa ja vaatii vain vähän valvontaa.', 'id': 'Menyebabkan informasi dari berbagai bagian dari sebuah bagian untuk mendapatkan jawaban adalah tantangan terbuka untuk membaca-memahami model. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperlihatkan pendekatan bahwa alasan tentang pertanyaan kompleks dengan menyatukan mereka ke subpertanyaan sederhana yang dapat mengambil keuntungan dari model ekstraksi baca-pemahaman jangka tunggal, dan mendapatkan jawaban akhir menurut instruksi dalam templat alasan yang terdefinisikan sebelumnya. Kita fokus pada pertanyaan aritmetik berdasarkan tolak dan mengevaluasi pendekatan kita pada subset dataset DROP. Kami menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita kompetitif dengan keadaan seni sementara dapat diterjemahkan dan membutuhkan sedikit pengawasan.', 'he': 'הסיבה על מידע ממספר חלקים של מעבר כדי להשיג תשובה היא אתגר פתוח למודלים קריאה-הבנה. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים גישה כי סיבות על שאלות מורכבות על ידי פירוק אותם לתת שאלות פשוטות יותר שיכולות לנצל מודלים קריאה-הבנה של היציאה במרחק אחד, ומוציאים את התשובה הסופית לפי ההוראות במדל הגיון מוגדר מראש. אנו מתמקדים בשאלות ארטימטיות מבוססות על החלק ולעריך את הגישה שלנו על תחתונה של קבוצת נתונים DROP. We show that our approach is competitive with the state of the art while being interpretable and requires little supervision.', 'ha': "Akarin karanta information daga sãshen biyu na tafasar da za'a motsa jibu, yana da wata kima bayyananna wa misãlai-na-karanta. Daga wannan takardan, Munã zo da wani matsayi wanda ke tambayar su masu husu da su ga zama masu sauki masu bin tambayar da za'a iya amfani da misãlai masu karatun karatun-karatun na guda-span, kuma yana da jibin ƙarshen ta gaba da inganci da aka umurce su a cikin wani namani na bayani. Tuna kiyaye a kan subtraction masu sakan arithmetic kuma munã ƙaddara hanyarmu a kan ƙanƙan da danne-danne na DCRP. Tuna nũna cewa hanyarmu yana ta yi gauraya da halin fassarar da idan an fassarar da fassarar da kuma yana da muhimmi kaɗan.", 'jv': 'Lakok mbukak informasi ning katimbang kelas sing sampeyan pasar kanggo tanggal responsi iki dadi buku perbudhakan kanggo ngubah model sing paling-perusahaan Nang kuwi iki, kita nambah dadi kapan kanggo masalah akeh sing komplikasi sing nguasai iki dadi supoyo sing luwih apik lan gambar kelas nyong nggawe nguasai model sing kelas-kotar to layang-komplikasi sing apik, lan mau iso dianggap tukulah dhéwé Awak dhéwé éntukno karo nggambar aturan akeh pisan karo ingkang dipunangé nggawe balêh kanggo ngerasakno dadi nggawe barang. Awak dhéwé ngerasakno ngono hal-hal sing medhayan karo perusahaan kanggo nguasakno karo hal ujaran lan kudu nggugu barang.', 'sk': 'Razmišljanje o informacijah iz več delov odlomka za izpeljavo odgovora je odprt izziv za modele bralno-razumevanja. V prispevku predstavljamo pristop, ki obravnava kompleksna vprašanja tako, da jih razgradi v enostavnejša podvprašanja, ki lahko izkoristijo modele branja-razumevanja ekstrakcije z enim razponom, in izpelje končni odgovor po navodilih v vnaprej določeni predlogi razmišljanja. Osredotočamo se na aritmetična vprašanja na podlagi odštevanja in ocenjujemo naš pristop na podnaboru podatkov DROP. Pokazujemo, da je naš pristop konkurenčen z najsodobnejšim, hkrati pa je razložljiv in zahteva malo nadzora.', 'bo': 'གཡོག་ཟིན་པའི་ཆ་ཤས་མང་ཙམ་གྱི་ནང་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི་ཁ་ཕྱེས་ཀྱི་གདོང་ལེན་པ་ཞིག་ནི་ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་གདོང་ལེན ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་དག་དེ་ཚོ་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཕྱོགས་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་སྒྱུ་རྩལ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་སྟངས་མངོན་གསལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དང་།'}
{'en': 'Development of Conversational AI for Sleep Coaching Programme', 'ar': 'تطوير الذكاء الاصطناعي التحاوري لبرنامج التدريب على النوم', 'pt': 'Desenvolvimento de IA Conversacional para Programa de Coaching do Sono', 'es': 'Desarrollo del programa de IA conversacional para el entrenamiento del sueño', 'fr': "Développement d'une IA conversationnelle pour le programme de coaching du sommeil", 'ja': '睡眠コーチングプログラムのための会話型AIの開発', 'hi': 'स्लीप कोचिंग कार्यक्रम के लिए संवादी एआई का विकास', 'zh': 'ĺŹ‘çś\xa0čľ…ĺŻĽäĽščŻťAIč®ˇ', 'ru': 'Разработка программы «Разговорный ИИ для коучинга сна»', 'ga': 'Forbairt AI Conversational don Chlár um Chóitseáil Codlata', 'ka': 'განვითარება კონტაქციური AI პროგრამის განვითარება', 'el': 'Ανάπτυξη της συζήτησης τεχνητής νοημοσύνης για το πρόγραμμα προπόνησης ύπνου', 'hu': 'Beszélgetési mesterséges intelligencia fejlesztése az alvás coaching programhoz', 'it': 'Sviluppo di AI conversazionali per il programma di coaching del sonno', 'kk': 'Ойып оқыту бағдарламасының ақпараттық AI жасау', 'lt': 'Development of Conversational AI for Sleep Coaching Programme', 'ml': 'ഉറക്കത്തിനുള്ള പ്രോഗ്രാമിനുള്ള സംസാരിക്കുന്ന AI വികസിപ്പ്', 'mn': 'Хунтах Сургуулийн ХАБ-ын хөгжлийн хөгжлийн', 'no': 'Utvikling av samtale AI for søvnøvingsprogram', 'pl': 'Rozwój konwersacyjnej AI dla programu coachingu snu', 'ms': 'Pembangunan AI Perbualan untuk Program Pelatihan Tidur', 'ro': 'Dezvoltarea AI conversațională pentru programul de coaching în somn', 'mt': 'L-iżvilupp ta’ AI konverżjonali għall-Programm ta’ Kopertura fl-irqad', 'si': 'නිදාන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න වැඩසටහන් කතාවක් AI විකාශය', 'sr': 'Razvoj razgovornog AI za trening za spavanje', 'so': 'Development AI for Sleep Coaching Programme', 'sv': 'Utveckling av Conversational AI för Sleep Coaching Program', 'mk': 'Развој на програмата за конверзационална интелектрична енергија за тренирање за спиење', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'سوپ کوئنگ پروگرام کے لئے صحبت کی AI کی توسعہ', 'vi': 'Phát triển Al đối thoại cho chương trình chăn gối', 'uz': 'Name', 'da': 'Udvikling af Conversational AI for Sleep Coaching Program', 'nl': 'Ontwikkeling van Conversational AI voor Slaapcoaching Programma', 'hr': 'Razvoj razgovornog AI za trening spavanja', 'bg': 'Разработване на разговорна програма за Коучинг на съня', 'de': 'Entwicklung von Conversational AI für Schlaf Coaching Programm', 'ko': '수면지도 계획에 사용되는 대화 인공지능 개발', 'sw': 'Maendeleo ya AI ya mazungumzo kwa ajili ya Mpango wa Kupiga kulala', 'id': 'Pembangunan AI percakapan untuk Program Pelatihan Tidur', 'fa': 'توسعه AI مبارزه برای برنامه آموزش خواب', 'tr': 'Uçmak Edme Programi üçin soňlaşma AI gelişmesi', 'af': 'Ontwikkeling van Gespraakte AI vir Slaap Oefening Program', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'sq': 'Zhvillimi i AI konversational për programin e trajnimit të gjumit', 'bs': 'Razvoj razgovornog AI za trening spavanja', 'hy': 'Քունի մարզիչ ծրագրի հաղորդակցման ԱԲ-ի զարգացումը', 'az': 'Uyuq təhsil proqramı üçün Qonuşma AI təhsil etməsi', 'bn': 'স্লুপ কচিং প্রোগ্রামের জন্য আলোচনার AI উন্নয়ন', 'cs': 'Vývoj konverzační AI pro program koučování spánku', 'et': 'Vestlusliku tehisintellekti väljatöötamine unejuhendamise programmi jaoks', 'fi': 'Conversational AI for Sleep Coaching -ohjelman kehittäminen', 'ca': "Desenvolviment d'AI conversacional per al programa d'entrenament al sono", 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Dewisan AI Perkarahaan kanggo Program-Kowati nggawe', 'bo': 'གཏམ་གླེང་གླེང་མོལ་གྱི་AI འོང་སྒོ་གཏོང་གི་བྱ་རིམ་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང།', 'he': 'Development of Conversational AI for Sleep Coaching Programme', 'sk': 'Razvoj programa pogovorne umetne inteligence za coaching spanja'}
{'en': 'Almost 30 % of the adult population in the world is experiencing or has experience insomnia. Cognitive Behaviour Therapy for insomnia (CBT-I) is one of the most effective treatment, but it has limitations on accessibility and availability. Utilising technology is one of the possible solutions, but existing methods neglect conversational aspects, which plays a critical role in sleep therapy. To address this issue, we propose a PhD project exploring potentials of developing conversational artificial intelligence (AI) for a sleep coaching programme, which is motivated by CBT-I treatment. This PhD project aims to develop natural language processing (NLP) algorithms to allow the system to interact naturally with a user and provide automated analytic system to support human experts. In this paper, we introduce research questions lying under three phases of the sleep coaching programme : triaging, monitoring the progress, and providing coaching. We expect this research project’s outcomes could contribute to the research domains of NLP and AI but also the healthcare field by providing a more accessible and affordable sleep treatment solution and an automated analytic system to lessen the burden of human experts.', 'ar': 'ما يقرب من 30 ٪ من السكان البالغين في العالم يعانون أو يعانون من الأرق. يعد العلاج السلوكي المعرفي للأرق (CBT-I) أحد أكثر العلاجات فعالية ، ولكن له قيود على إمكانية الوصول والتوافر. يعد استخدام التكنولوجيا أحد الحلول الممكنة ، لكن الأساليب الحالية تتجاهل جوانب المحادثة ، والتي تلعب دورًا مهمًا في علاج النوم. لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، نقترح مشروع دكتوراه يستكشف إمكانات تطوير الذكاء الاصطناعي للمحادثة (AI) لبرنامج التدريب على النوم ، والذي يحفزه العلاج CBT-I. يهدف مشروع الدكتوراه هذا إلى تطوير خوارزميات معالجة اللغة الطبيعية (NLP) للسماح للنظام بالتفاعل بشكل طبيعي مع المستخدم وتوفير نظام تحليلي آلي لدعم الخبراء البشريين. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم أسئلة بحثية تندرج تحت ثلاث مراحل من برنامج التدريب على النوم: الفرز ، ومراقبة التقدم ، وتوفير التدريب. نتوقع أن تساهم نتائج هذا المشروع البحثي في مجالات البحث في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية والذكاء الاصطناعي وأيضًا في مجال الرعاية الصحية من خلال توفير حل علاج للنوم يسهل الوصول إليه وبأسعار معقولة ونظام تحليلي آلي لتقليل عبء الخبراء البشريين.', 'pt': 'Quase 30% da população adulta do mundo sofre ou já teve insônia. A Terapia Cognitivo Comportamental para insônia (TCC-I) é um dos tratamentos mais eficazes, mas apresenta limitações quanto à acessibilidade e disponibilidade. A utilização da tecnologia é uma das soluções possíveis, mas os métodos existentes negligenciam os aspectos conversacionais, que desempenham um papel crítico na terapia do sono. Para abordar esta questão, propomos um projeto de doutorado explorando potenciais de desenvolvimento de inteligência artificial conversacional (IA) para um programa de coaching do sono, que é motivado pelo tratamento CBT-I. Este projeto de doutorado visa desenvolver algoritmos de processamento de linguagem natural (PLN) para permitir que o sistema interaja naturalmente com um usuário e fornecer sistema analítico automatizado para apoiar especialistas humanos. Neste artigo, apresentamos questões de pesquisa em três fases do programa de coaching do sono: triagem, monitoramento do progresso e fornecimento de coaching. Esperamos que os resultados deste projeto de pesquisa possam contribuir para os domínios de pesquisa de PNL e IA, mas também para o campo da saúde, fornecendo uma solução de tratamento do sono mais acessível e acessível e um sistema analítico automatizado para diminuir a carga de especialistas humanos.', 'es': 'Casi el 30% de la población adulta del mundo sufre o ha padecido insomnio. La terapia cognitiva conductual para el insomnio (TCC-I) es uno de los tratamientos más eficaces, pero tiene limitaciones en cuanto a accesibilidad y disponibilidad. La utilización de la tecnología es una de las posibles soluciones, pero los métodos existentes descuidan los aspectos conversacionales, que desempeñan un papel fundamental en la terapia del sueño. Para abordar este tema, proponemos un proyecto de doctorado que explora las posibilidades de desarrollar inteligencia artificial (IA) conversacional para un programa de entrenamiento del sueño, que está motivado por el tratamiento de TCC-I. Este proyecto de doctorado tiene como objetivo desarrollar algoritmos de procesamiento del lenguaje natural (NLP) para permitir que el sistema interactúe de forma natural con un usuario y proporcionar un sistema analítico automatizado para apoyar a los expertos humanos. En este artículo, presentamos preguntas de investigación que se encuentran en tres fases del programa de entrenamiento del sueño: clasificación, monitoreo del progreso y capacitación. Esperamos que los resultados de este proyecto de investigación puedan contribuir a los dominios de investigación de la PNL y la IA, pero también al campo de la salud, proporcionando una solución de tratamiento del sueño más accesible y asequible y un sistema analítico automatizado para reducir la carga de los expertos humanos.', 'fr': "Près de 30\xa0% de la population adulte dans le monde souffre ou souffre d'insomnie. La thérapie cognitivo-comportementale pour l'insomnie (CBT-I) est l'un des traitements les plus efficaces, mais son accessibilité et sa disponibilité sont limitées. L'utilisation de la technologie est l'une des solutions possibles, mais les méthodes existantes négligent les aspects conversationnels, qui jouent un rôle essentiel dans la thérapie du sommeil. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous proposons un projet de doctorat explorant les potentiels de développement de l'intelligence artificielle (IA) conversationnelle pour un programme de coaching du sommeil, qui est motivé par le traitement CBT-I. Ce projet de doctorat vise à développer des algorithmes de traitement du langage naturel (NLP) afin de permettre au système d'interagir naturellement avec un utilisateur et de fournir un système analytique automatisé pour soutenir les experts humains. Dans cet article, nous présentons des questions de recherche relevant de trois phases du programme de coaching du sommeil\xa0: le triage, le suivi des progrès et le coaching. Nous pensons que les résultats de ce projet de recherche pourraient contribuer aux domaines de recherche de la PNL et de l'IA, mais également au domaine de la santé en fournissant une solution de traitement du sommeil plus accessible et plus abordable et un système d'analyse automatisé pour alléger le fardeau des experts humains.", 'zh': '世间近30%成人,经历失所眠。 失眠知行(CBT-I)最效之一,然在可及性可用性局限性。 用术者,解决方案之一也,而今术忽于对,而对卧治中起至重也。 为此一博士项目,探为眠眠教练计开会话人工智能(AI)之力,其机CBT-I治。 其博士项目在开自然语言处(NLP)算法,使统得与用户自然交,而给自析其统以支人家。 于本文中,我们介了睡眠指导三段的研究:分类,监测进度和供给指导。 计其项目者,可以益便;惠睡者,可以治解决方案自动化,可以宽人家之累,所以效NLPAI之域,及医疗保健之域也。', 'hi': 'दुनिया में वयस्क आबादी का लगभग 30% अनिद्रा का अनुभव कर रहा है या अनुभव कर रहा है। अनिद्रा के लिए संज्ञानात्मक व्यवहार थेरेपी (सीबीटी-आई) सबसे प्रभावी उपचार में से एक है, लेकिन इसकी पहुंच और उपलब्धता पर सीमाएं हैं। प्रौद्योगिकी का उपयोग करना संभावित समाधानों में से एक है, लेकिन मौजूदा तरीके संवादात्मक पहलुओं की उपेक्षा करते हैं, जो नींद चिकित्सा में महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाता है। इस मुद्दे को हल करने के लिए, हम एक पीएचडी परियोजना का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो नींद कोचिंग कार्यक्रम के लिए संवादात्मक कृत्रिम बुद्धिमत्ता (एआई) विकसित करने की क्षमताओं की खोज करता है, जो सीबीटी-आई उपचार से प्रेरित है। इस पीएचडी परियोजना का उद्देश्य प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण (एनएलपी) एल्गोरिदम विकसित करना है ताकि सिस्टम को उपयोगकर्ता के साथ स्वाभाविक रूप से बातचीत करने और मानव विशेषज्ञों का समर्थन करने के लिए स्वचालित विश्लेषणात्मक प्रणाली प्रदान करने की अनुमति मिल सके। इस पेपर में, हम नींद कोचिंग कार्यक्रम के तीन चरणों के तहत झूठ बोलने वाले शोध प्रश्नों को पेश करते हैं: ट्राइएजिंग, प्रगति की निगरानी, और कोचिंग प्रदान करना। हम उम्मीद करते हैं कि इस शोध परियोजना के परिणाम एनएलपी और एआई के अनुसंधान डोमेन में योगदान कर सकते हैं, लेकिन मानव विशेषज्ञों के बोझ को कम करने के लिए एक अधिक सुलभ और सस्ती नींद उपचार समाधान और एक स्वचालित विश्लेषणात्मक प्रणाली प्रदान करके स्वास्थ्य सेवा क्षेत्र भी।', 'ja': '世界の成人人口のほぼ30%が不眠症を経験しています。 不眠症に対する認知行動療法（ CBT - I ）は、最も効果的な治療法の1つですが、アクセシビリティと可用性に制限があります。 テクノロジーを活用することは、考えられる解決策の1つですが、既存の方法は、睡眠療法において重要な役割を果たす会話的側面を軽視しています。 この問題に対処するために、CBT - I治療に動機づけられた睡眠コーチングプログラムのための会話型人工知能（ AI ）開発の可能性を探るPhDプロジェクトを提案します。 このPhDプロジェクトは、自然言語処理（ NLP ）アルゴリズムを開発し、システムがユーザーと自然に相互作用し、人間の専門家をサポートする自動分析システムを提供することを目的としています。 この論文では、睡眠コーチングプログラムの3つのフェーズ（トリアージング、進捗状況の監視、コーチングの提供）の下にある研究質問を紹介します。 この研究プロジェクトの成果は、よりアクセスしやすく手頃な価格の睡眠治療ソリューションと、人間の専門家の負担を軽減する自動分析システムを提供することにより、NLPとAIの研究領域に貢献することが期待されています。', 'ru': 'Почти 30% взрослого населения в мире испытывает или испытывает бессонницу. Когнитивно-поведенческая терапия бессонницы (КПТ-I) является одним из наиболее эффективных методов лечения, но она имеет ограничения по доступности и доступности. Использование технологии является одним из возможных решений, но существующие методы пренебрегают разговорными аспектами, которые играют решающую роль в терапии сна. Для решения этой проблемы мы предлагаем проект PhD, изучающий возможности развития разговорного искусственного интеллекта (ИИ) для программы коучинга сна, которая мотивирована лечением CBT-I. Этот проект PhD направлен на разработку алгоритмов обработки естественного языка (NLP), чтобы система могла взаимодействовать естественным образом с пользователем и обеспечить автоматизированную аналитическую систему для поддержки человеческих экспертов. В этой статье мы представляем исследовательские вопросы, лежащие в рамках трех этапов программы коучинга сна: коллизия, мониторинг прогресса и обеспечение коучинга. Мы ожидаем, что результаты этого исследовательского проекта могут способствовать исследовательским областям NLP и AI, а также области здравоохранения, предоставляя более доступное и доступное решение для лечения сна и автоматизированную аналитическую систему, чтобы уменьшить нагрузку на человеческих экспертов.', 'ga': 'Tá insomnia ag beagnach 30% de dhaonra daoine fásta an domhain nó tá taithí acu ar insomnia. Tá Teiripe Iompraíochta Cognaíoch le haghaidh insomnia (CBT-I) ar cheann de na cóireálacha is éifeachtaí, ach tá teorainneacha aige maidir le hinrochtaineacht agus infhaighteacht. Tá úsáid na teicneolaíochta ar cheann de na réitigh fhéideartha, ach déantar faillí sna modhanna atá ann cheana féin ar ghnéithe comhrá, a bhfuil ról ríthábhachtach acu i teiripe codlata. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an tsaincheist seo, molaimid tionscadal PhD a scrúdaíonn na féidearthachtaí a bhaineann le hintleacht shaorga chomhrá (AI) a fhorbairt do chlár cóitseála codlata, atá spreagtha ag cóireáil CBT-I. Tá sé mar aidhm ag an tionscadal PhD seo algartaim próiseála teanga nádúrtha (NLP) a fhorbairt chun ligean don chóras idirghníomhú go nádúrtha le húsáideoir agus córas uathoibrithe anailíse a sholáthar chun tacú le saineolaithe daonna. Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid isteach ceisteanna taighde atá suite faoi thrí chéim den chlár um chóitseáil codlata: triáiseáil, monatóireacht a dhéanamh ar dhul chun cinn, agus oiliúint a sholáthar. Táimid ag súil go bhféadfadh torthaí an tionscadail taighde seo cur le réimsí taighde NLP agus AI ach freisin leis an réimse cúram sláinte trí réiteach cóireála codlata níos inrochtana agus níos inacmhainne agus córas uathoibrithe anailíse a sholáthar chun ualach na saineolaithe daonna a laghdú.', 'el': 'Σχεδόν 30% του ενήλικου πληθυσμού στον κόσμο βιώνει ή έχει εμπειρία αϋπνίας. Η Γνωστική Συμπεριφερειακή Θεραπεία για την αϋπνία (είναι μια από τις πιο αποτελεσματικές θεραπείες, αλλά έχει περιορισμούς στην προσβασιμότητα και τη διαθεσιμότητα. Η χρήση της τεχνολογίας είναι μια από τις πιθανές λύσεις, αλλά οι υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι παραμελούν τις πτυχές της συνομιλίας, η οποία διαδραματίζει κρίσιμο ρόλο στη θεραπεία ύπνου. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το ζήτημα, προτείνουμε ένα διδακτορικό έργο που διερευνά τις δυνατότητες ανάπτυξης τεχνητής νοημοσύνης συζήτησης (τεχνητής νοημοσύνης) για ένα πρόγραμμα προπόνησης ύπνου, το οποίο παρακινείται από τη θεραπεία ΚΒ-Ι. Αυτό το διδακτορικό έργο στοχεύει στην ανάπτυξη αλγορίθμων επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας για να επιτρέψει στο σύστημα να αλληλεπιδρά φυσικά με έναν χρήστη και να παρέχει αυτοματοποιημένο αναλυτικό σύστημα για την υποστήριξη ανθρώπινων εμπειρογνωμόνων. Στην παρούσα εργασία, εισάγουμε ερευνητικά ερωτήματα που εμπίπτουν σε τρεις φάσεις του προγράμματος προπόνησης ύπνου: τη διαλογή, την παρακολούθηση της προόδου και την παροχή καθοδήγησης. Αναμένουμε ότι τα αποτελέσματα αυτού του ερευνητικού έργου θα μπορούσαν να συμβάλουν στους ερευνητικούς τομείς της ΝΛΠ και της τεχνητής νοημοσύνης αλλά και στον τομέα της υγειονομικής περίθαλψης παρέχοντας μια πιο προσιτή και προσιτή λύση θεραπείας ύπνου και ένα αυτοματοποιημένο αναλυτικό σύστημα που θα μειώσει το βάρος των ανθρώπινων εμπειρογνωμόνων.', 'ka': 'მსოფლიოში პირდაპირად 30% წლის ადამიანების მოცდილობა იქნება ან აქვს განცდილობა. კონციენტიური მონაცემების ტეპაფია ინსონია (CBT-I) არის ყველაზე ეფექტიური მეფექციის ერთი, მაგრამ ის აქვს უფრო ეფექტიური მონაცემების და მონაცემების შესახებ. ტექნოლოგიის გამოყენება არის შესაძლებელი გარეშების ერთი, მაგრამ არსებობს მეტი, რომელიც კრიტიკური პროლის შემდეგ გარეშე ტექნოლოგიაში. ამ პროგრამის შესახებ, ჩვენ პროექტის PhD პროექტის გამოყენება, რომელიც CBT-I-ის გამოყენებაში მოტივირებულია. ამ პროექტის პროექტის მიზეზია, რომ სახელსაწყოთან გამოყენებელი და ადამიანის ექსპერტების მხარდაჭირებაში ავტომატიური ანალიტიკური სისტემის განვითარება (NLP) ალგორიტემის განვითარე ამ დოგომაში ჩვენ შევცვალობთ კითხვები, რომლებიც სამი ფაზების შემწავლობის პროგრამის ქვემოთ: საწყისი, პროგრამის მონარჩენა და შემწავლობა. ჩვენ დავიწყებთ, რომ ეს პროექტის შედეგები შეიძლება შეიძლება გავაკეთოთ NLP და AI-ის განსწავლებელი კომპონეტების კომპონეტებში, მაგრამ სხვა ჯანმრთელი კომპონეტების კომპონეტების კომპონ', 'hu': 'A világ felnőtt lakosságának közel 30%-a álmatlanságot tapasztal vagy tapasztal. Az álmatlanság kognitív viselkedésterápiája (CBT-I) az egyik leghatékonyabb kezelés, de korlátozza a hozzáférhetőséget és a rendelkezésre állást. A technológia használata az egyik lehetséges megoldás, de a meglévő módszerek figyelmen kívül hagyják a beszélgetési szempontokat, amelyek kritikus szerepet játszanak az alvásterápiában. Ennek a kérdésnek a megoldására egy CBT-I kezeléssel ösztönző alvásvezető program keretében javasoltunk egy PhD projektet, amely feltárja a beszélgetési mesterséges intelligencia (AI) fejlesztésének lehetőségeit. A PhD projekt célja a természetes nyelvfeldolgozási algoritmusok (NLP) kidolgozása, amelyek lehetővé teszik a rendszer számára, hogy természetes módon interakcióba lépjen a felhasználóval, és automatizált analitikai rendszert biztosítson az emberi szakértők támogatására. Ebben a tanulmányban az alvás coaching program három fázisában rejlő kutatási kérdéseket mutatunk be: triaging, haladás figyelemmel kísérése és coaching biztosítása. Várjuk, hogy a kutatási projekt eredményei hozzájárulhatnak az NLP és AI kutatási területeihez, de az egészségügyi területhez is, egy hozzáférhetőbb és megfizethetőbb alváskezelési megoldás és egy automatizált analitikai rendszer biztosításával, amely csökkenti az emberi szakértők terheit.', 'it': "Quasi il 30% della popolazione adulta nel mondo soffre o soffre di insonnia. La terapia cognitiva del comportamento per l'insonnia (CBT-I) è uno dei trattamenti più efficaci, ma ha limitazioni in termini di accessibilità e disponibilità. L'utilizzo della tecnologia è una delle soluzioni possibili, ma i metodi esistenti trascurano gli aspetti conversazionali, che svolgono un ruolo fondamentale nella terapia del sonno. Per affrontare questo problema, proponiamo un progetto di dottorato che esplora le potenzialità dello sviluppo dell'intelligenza artificiale conversazionale (AI) per un programma di coaching del sonno, motivato dal trattamento CBT-I. Questo progetto di dottorato mira a sviluppare algoritmi di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale (NLP) per consentire al sistema di interagire in modo naturale con un utente e fornire un sistema analitico automatizzato a supporto degli esperti umani. In questo articolo introduciamo domande di ricerca che si trovano in tre fasi del programma di coaching del sonno: triaging, monitoraggio dei progressi e fornitura di coaching. Ci aspettiamo che i risultati di questo progetto di ricerca possano contribuire ai settori di ricerca della PNL e dell'AI, ma anche al settore sanitario fornendo una soluzione di trattamento del sonno più accessibile e conveniente e un sistema analitico automatizzato per ridurre il peso degli esperti umani.", 'kk': 'Әлемдегі үлкен адамдардың 30% жақын тәжірибесі немесе тәжірибесі бар. Бірақ оның мүмкіндіктері мен мүмкіндіктерінің шектеулері бар. Технологияны қолдану мүмкін шешімдерінің бірі, бірақ бар әдістері жалғастырылық аспектерін елемейді. Бұл ұйықтау терапиясында көп рольді орындайды. Бұл мәселеге қатынау үшін, CBT-I лекциясы бойынша монтификациялық көңіл бақылау бағдарламасын жасау мүмкіндіктерін доктор жобасына зерттеуді ұсынамыз. Бұл доктор жобасы табиғлық тіл процессері (NLP) алгоритмдерін құру үшін жүйенің пайдаланушымен байланысты істеу және адам эксперттерін қолдау үшін автоматты аналитикалық жүйесін қамтамасыз етеді. Бұл қағазда, біз ұйып оқыту бағдарламасының үш фазындағы зерттеу сұрақтарын келтіреміз: тәжірибе, бағдарламасын қарау және оқыту. Бұл зерттеу жобасының нәтижелері NLP және AI зерттеу домендеріне көмектесе алады, сондай-ақ саулық көмектесу өрісін көмектесе алатын және көмектесуі мүмкіндік және көмектесуі мүмкіндік болатын ұйықтау шеші', 'ms': 'Hampir 30% penduduk dewasa di dunia mengalami atau mengalami insomnia. Terapi Kelakuan Pengetahuan untuk ketiadaan tidur (CBT-I) adalah salah satu rawatan yang paling berkesan, tetapi ia mempunyai keterangan pada aksesibiliti dan keberhasilan. Penggunaan teknologi adalah salah satu penyelesaian yang mungkin, tetapi kaedah yang ada mengabaikan aspek perbualan, yang bermain peran kritik dalam terapi tidur. Untuk mengatasi isu ini, kami cadangkan projek doktor yang mengeksplorasi potensi untuk mengembangkan kecerdasan buatan perbualan (AI) untuk program latihan tidur, yang disebabkan oleh rawatan CBT-I. Projek PhD ini bertujuan untuk mengembangkan algoritma pemprosesan bahasa semulajadi (NLP) untuk membenarkan sistem untuk berinteraksi secara semulajadi dengan pengguna dan menyediakan sistem analitik automatik untuk menyokong pakar manusia. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan soalan kajian berbaring di bawah tiga fasa program latihan tidur: triaging, mengawasi kemajuan, dan menyediakan latihan. Kami mengharapkan hasil projek penyelidikan ini boleh menyumbang ke bidang penyelidikan NLP dan AI tetapi juga bidang rawatan kesehatan dengan menyediakan penyelesaian rawatan tidur yang lebih mudah dan cenderung dan sistem analitik automatik untuk mengurangkan beban ahli manusia.', 'lt': 'Beveik 30 % suaugusiųjų pasaulyje patiria arba yra nemiga. Cognitive Behaviour Therapy for insomnia (CBT-I) is one of the most effective treatment, but it has limitations on accessibility and availability.  Technologijos naudojimas yra vienas iš galimų sprendimų, tačiau esami metodai neatsižvelgia į pokalbio aspektus, kurie atlieka svarbų vaidmenį miego terapijoje. Siekiant išspręsti šį klausimą, siūlome doktorantūros projektą, kuriame išnagrinėtos galimybės plėtoti sąvokinę dirbtinę žvalgybą (AI) miego mokymo programai, kuri pagrįsta gydymu CBT-I. Šiuo doktorantūros projektu siekiama sukurti natūralaus kalbų apdorojimo (NLP) algoritmus, kad sistema galėtų natūraliai sąveikauti su naudotoju ir sukurti automatinę analizės sistemą žmonių ekspertams remti. Šiame dokumente mes pateikiame mokslinius tyrimus, susijusius su trimis miego mokymo programos etapais: bandymu, pažangos stebėjimu ir mokymo teikimu. Tikimės, kad šio mokslinių tyrimų projekto rezultatai galėtų prisidėti prie NLP ir AI mokslinių tyrimų sričių, taip pat sveikatos priežiūros srities, užtikrinant prieinamesnį ir prieinamesnį miego gydymo sprendimą ir automatizuotą analizės sistemą, kad sumažėtų žmogaus ekspertų našta.', 'ml': 'ലോകത്തിലെ മുതിര്\u200dന്ന പ്രായമുള്ള ആള്\u200dക്കാരില്\u200d മുപ്പത് ശതമാനം അനുഭവിക്കുന്നുണ്ട്. അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d അധ സിബിടി-ഐ (സിബിടി-ഐ) അത്യുത്തമമായ ചികിത്രങ്ങളിലൊന്നാണ് കോണിനിവേറ്റിവ് സ്വഭാവം നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d എന്നിട്ടും അതിന്റെ പരിധി സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് സാധ്യതയുള്ള പരിഹരണങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒന്നാണ്, പക്ഷെ നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സാഹചര് ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d, സിബിറ്റി-I ചികിത്രത്തില്\u200d നിന്ന് പ്രോഗ്രാമിക്കുന്ന സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സാധ്യതകള്\u200d പരി ഈ PhD പദ്ധതി In this paper, we introduce research questions lying under three phases of the sleep coaching programme: triaging, monitoring the progress, and providing coaching.  നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു, ഈ പഠിക്കുന്ന പദ്ധതിയുടെ ഫലം NLP യുടെയും AI-ന്റെയും പഠിപ്പിന്റെയും ഡോമെന്\u200dസിലേക്ക് സഹായിക്കുമെന്ന്. പക്ഷെ ആശ്വാസ സ സേ', 'mk': 'Almost 30% of the adult population in the world is experiencing or has experience insomnia.  Когнитивното однесување Терапија за неспанија (CBT-I) е еден од најефикасните третмани, но има ограничувања на пристапноста и достапноста. Користењето на технологијата е едно од можните решенија, но постоечките методи ги забораваат разговорните аспекти, кои играат критична улога во терапијата за спиење. To address this issue, we propose a PhD project exploring potentials of developing conversational artificial intelligence (AI) for a sleep coaching programme, which is motivated by CBT-I treatment.  Овој докторски проект има за цел развој на алгоритми за природно обработување јазик (NLP) за да му овозможи на системот да интерактира природно со корисник и да обезбеди автоматизиран аналитички систем за поддршка на човековите експерти. Во овој документ, ние воведуваме истражувачки прашања кои се наоѓаат во три фази на програмата за тренинг за спиење: тренинг, следење на напредокот и обезбедување тренинг. Очекуваме резултатите на овој истражувачки проект да придонесат во областите на истражувањето на НЛП и АИ, но исто така и на областа на здравствената заштита со обезбедување попристапно и достапно решение за лекување на сонот и автоматизиран аналитички систем за намалување на тов', 'mn': 'Дэлхий дээрх томчуудын бараг 30% нь хүн амын амьдралын туршлага эсвэл амьдралын туршлага. Бурхан сэтгэл хөдлөлийн эмчилгээ (CBT-I) нь хамгийн үр дүнтэй эмчилгээний нэг юм. Гэхдээ үүнийг ашиглах болон ашиглах хязгаарлагддаг. Технологи ашиглах нь боломжтой шийдэлүүдийн нэг юм. Гэхдээ оршиж байгаа арга нь ярилцлагын асуудлыг алдахгүй байдаг. Энэ нь унтах эмчилгээнд чухал үүрэг тоглодог. Энэ асуудлыг олохын тулд бид CBT-I эмчилгээнд уран бүтээлч ухаан (AI) хөгжүүлэх боломжуудыг судлах докторын төслийг санал болгож байна. Энэ докторын төслийг байгалийн хэл процесс (NLP) алгоритмыг хөгжүүлэх зорилго нь системийг хэрэглэгчидтэй байгалийн харилцаа болон хүний мэргэжилтнүүдийг дэмжихийн тулд автоматаар анализ системийг хангах боломжтой. Энэ цаасан дээр бид унтаж суралцах хөтөлбөрийн гурван дасгал доор байгаа судалгааны асуултуудыг танилцуулж байна: судалгаа, хөгжлийг ажиглаж, дасгал өгдөг. Бид энэ судалгааны төслийн үр дүнүүд нь NLP болон AI-ын судалгааны талбайд нөлөөлөх боломжтой болно. Мөн эрүүл мэндийн талбайд илүү ашиглах боломжтой, эрүүл мэндийн эмчилгээний шийдвэр болон хүний мэргэжилтнүүдийн ачааллыг багасгах автоматжуулсан ана', 'no': 'Nærmest 30% av den voksne befolkningen i verden er opplevd eller har erfaring usinnomsikt. Kognitiv atferdsterapija for insomnia (CBT-I) er ein av dei mest effektive behandlingane, men det har grenser på tilgjengelighet og tilgjengelighet. Brukarteknologi er ein av dei moglege løysingane, men eksisterande metodane forskyv omtaleaspektane, som speler ein kritisk rolle i søvnterapija. For å handtera dette problemet, foreslår vi eit PhD-prosjekt som utforskar potensialane for å utvikla konversjonale kunstiske intelligens (AI) for eit søvnøvingsprogram, som er motivert av CBT-I-behandling. Dette PhD-prosjektet må utvikla naturspråksbehandlingar (NLP) algoritme for å tillata systemet å samarbeida naturleg med ein brukar og gi automatisk analytisk system for å støtta menneskelige ekspertar. I denne papiret introduserer vi forskningsspørsmål som ligg under tre fasar i søvn-treningasprogrammet: forsøk, overvåking av framgang og tilbygging. Vi forventar at resultatet av dette forskningsprosjektet kan bidra til forskningsdomene av NLP og AI, men også helseområdet ved å gjera ein tilgjengeleg og tilgjengeleg løysing for s øvnbehandling og ein automatisk analytisk system for å løse båten av menneske ekspertar.', 'sr': 'Skoro 30% odrasle populacije na svijetu iskusiva ili ima iskustvo nesanice. Terapija kognitivnog ponašanja za nesanicu (CBT-I) je jedna od najefikasnijih tretmana, ali ima ograničenja pristupnosti i dostupnosti. Koristivanje tehnologije je jedna od mogućih rješenja, ali postojeće metode zanemaruju razgovorne aspekte, koja igra kritičnu ulogu u terapiji spavanja. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja predlažemo projekt doktora koji istražuje potencijale razvoja razgovorne umjetne inteligencije (AI) za program treninga spavanja, koji je motivisan liječenjem CBT-I. Ovaj doktorski projekt ima cilj da razvije algoritme prirodnog obrade jezika (NLP) kako bi sistem omogućio prirodno interakciju sa korisnikom i pružio automatski analitički sistem za podršku ljudskih stručnjaka. U ovom papiru predstavljamo istraživačka pitanja koja leži ispod tri faze programa treninga spavanja: ispitivanje, praćenje napreda i pružanje treninga. Očekujemo da bi rezultati ovog projekta istraživanja mogli doprinijeti istraživanju domena NLP i AI, ali i zdravstvenom polju pružanjem dostupnijeg i dostupnijeg rješenja liječenja spavanjem i automatskog analitičkog sistema da smanji teret ljudskih stručnjaka.', 'si': 'ලෝකයේ ප්\u200dරාමාණික විශාල විශාල විශාල 30% ක් අතුරුදන් වෙනවා නැත්නම් අතුරුදන් වෙනවා. අසාන්මියාව සඳහා සංවේදනය ව්\u200dයාප්\u200dත ව්\u200dයාප්\u200dතිය (CBT-I) එක තමයි හොඳම ප්\u200dරභාවිත ව්\u200dයාප්\u200dතියෙන් එකක්, නමුත් ඒකට ප්\u200dරභ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විස්තරයෙන් එකක්, නමුත් තියෙන්න තියෙන්නේ වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරතිකා මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන්න, අපි PhD ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න පුළුවන් විස්තර කරන්න, නිදානම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්  මේ PhD ව්\u200dයාපෘතිය අදහස් කරනවා ස්වභාවික භාෂාව පරික්ෂණය (NLP) ඇල්ගෝරිධම් විස්තර කරන්න, පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෙක් සමග ස්වභ මේ පත්තියේ අපි පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තුනක් තියෙන්නේ නිදාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ: ත්\u200dරියාගින්, ප්\u200dරශ්න අපි බලාපොරොත්තු කරනවා මේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියේ ප්\u200dරතිපූර්ණය NLP සහ AI ගේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය සහ ආරක්ෂාව ප්\u200dරවෘ', 'mt': 'Kważi 30% tal-popolazzjoni adulta fid-dinja qed tesperjenza jew għandha nuqqas ta’ rqad. It-Terapija tal-Imġiba Konjittiva għall-insomnja (CBT-I) hija waħda mill-aktar trattament effettiv, iżda għandha limitazzjonijiet fuq l-aċċessibbiltà u d-disponibbiltà. Utilising technology is one of the possible solutions, but existing methods neglect conversational aspects, which plays a critical role in sleep therapy.  To address this issue, we propose a PhD project exploring potentials of developing conversational artificial intelligence (AI) for a sleep coaching programme, which is motivated by CBT-I treatment.  This PhD project aims to develop natural language processing (NLP) algorithms to allow the system to interact naturally with a user and provide automated analytic system to support human experts.  F’dan id-dokument, aħna nintroduċu kwistjonijiet ta’ riċerka li jinsabu fi tliet fażijiet tal-programm ta’ taħriġ għall-irqad: it-triaġġ, il-monitoraġġ tal-progress, u l-għoti ta’ taħriġ. Aħna nistennew li r-riżultati ta’ dan il-proġett ta’ riċerka jistgħu jikkontribwixxu għall-oqsma ta’ riċerka tal-NLP u l-AI iżda wkoll il-qasam tal-kura tas-s a ħħa billi jipprovdu soluzzjoni ta’ trattament tal-irqad aktar aċċessibbli u bi prezz raġonevoli u sistema analitika awtomatizzata biex tnaqqas il-piż tal-esperti umani.', 'so': "Dhawr boqolkiiba 30% oo dadka waaweyn ee dunida jooga waxay soo maraan ama ay u baahan yihiin sharci la'aan. Diqsooyinka caasinimada (CBT-I) waa mid ka mid ah daryeelka ugu shaqeeya, laakiin waxay leedahay xadoor ku saabsan isticmaalka iyo helitaanka. Isku-isticmaalidda teknolojiyadu waa mid ka mid ah xalal suurtagal ah, laakiin qaababka joogta ah way ka jeedaan dhinaca iskala hadla, taasoo ka ciyaaraya qayb muhiim ah oo ku jirta terabiyada hurdada. Si aan arrintan ula macaamilo karno, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qoraal PhD ah oo ku baaraya awoodaha horumarinta waxyaabaha la xiriira cilmiga farshaxanka ah (AI) oo ah barnaamijka koobashada hurdada, kaas oo lagu dhaqaajiyo daryeelka CBT-I. Shaqadan PhD wuxuu ku qoran yahay horumarinta baaritaanka luuqada asalka ah (NLP) in nidaamka uu si dabiicadda ah ula xiriiro isticmaale, wuxuuna siiyaa nidaam analytika ah si ay u caawiyaan khabiirada biniaadamka. Warqadan waxaynu ku soo bandhignaa su'aalo baaritaan ah oo ku hoos yaal saddex marxalad oo ah barnaamijka wax ku barashada hurdada: cimriga, socoshada, iyo socoshada horumarinta iyo waxbarashada. Waxaynu filanaynaa inay dhamaadka arimahan baaritaanka ayaa ka faa’iidi kara meelaha waxbarashada ee NLP iyo AI, laakiin sidoo kale beerta daryeelka caafimaadka waxaa laga heli karaa xafiiska daryeelka hurdada oo aad u istaahilaan karto iyo nidaamka baaritaanka ah si uu u fududeeyo culaabka dadku.", 'sv': 'Nästan 30% av den vuxna befolkningen i världen upplever eller har sömnlöshet. Kognitiv beteendeterapi för sömnlöshet (CBT-I) är en av de mest effektiva behandlingen, men den har begränsningar för tillgänglighet och tillgänglighet. Att använda teknik är en av de möjliga lösningarna, men befintliga metoder försummar konversationsaspekter, vilket spelar en avgörande roll i sömnterapi. För att ta itu med denna fråga föreslår vi ett doktorandprojekt som utforskar potentialen för att utveckla konversationell artificiell intelligens (AI) för ett sömncoachningsprogram som motiveras av CBT-I-behandling. Detta doktorandprojekt syftar till att utveckla algoritmer för naturlig språkbearbetning (NLP) för att möjliggöra att systemet interagerar naturligt med en användare och tillhandahålla automatiserat analyssystem för att stödja mänskliga experter. I denna uppsats presenterar vi forskningsfrågor som ligger under tre faser av sömncoachningsprogrammet: triaging, uppföljning av framstegen och coaching. Vi förväntar oss att forskningsprojektets resultat kan bidra till forskningsområdena NLP och AI men också sjukvården genom att tillhandahålla en mer tillgänglig och prisvärd sömnbehandlingslösning och ett automatiserat analyssystem för att minska bördan för mänskliga experter.', 'pl': 'Prawie 30% dorosłej populacji na świecie doświadcza lub ma bezsenność. Poznawcza terapia behawioralna bezsenności (CBT-I) jest jednym z najskuteczniejszych leczenia, ale ma ograniczenia dostępności i dostępności. Wykorzystanie technologii jest jednym z możliwych rozwiązań, ale istniejące metody zaniedbują aspekty konwersacji, które odgrywają kluczową rolę w terapii snu. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, proponujemy projekt doktorancki badający potencjał rozwoju sztucznej inteligencji konwersacyjnej (AI) dla programu coachingu snu, który jest motywowany leczeniem CBT-I. Projekt doktorancki ma na celu opracowanie algorytmów przetwarzania języka naturalnego (NLP), aby umożliwić systemowi naturalną interakcję z użytkownikiem i zapewnić zautomatyzowany system analityczny wspierający ekspertów ludzkich. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy pytania badawcze leżące w trzech fazach programu coachingu snu: triaging, monitoring postępów i prowadzenie coachingu. Oczekujemy, że wyniki tego projektu badawczego mogą przyczynić się do badań w dziedzinie NLP i AI, ale także w dziedzinie opieki zdrowotnej poprzez zapewnienie bardziej dostępnego i przystępnego rozwiązania do leczenia snu oraz zautomatyzowanego systemu analitycznego zmniejszającego obciążenie ekspertów ludzkich.', 'ro': 'Aproape 30% din populația adultă din lume experimentează sau are insomnie. Terapia comportamentală cognitivă pentru insomnie (CBT-I) este unul dintre cele mai eficiente tratamente, dar are limitări în ceea ce privește accesibilitatea și disponibilitatea. Utilizarea tehnologiei este una dintre soluțiile posibile, dar metodele existente neglijează aspectele conversaționale, care joacă un rol esențial în terapia somnului. Pentru a aborda această problemă, propunem un proiect de doctorat care explorează potențialele dezvoltării inteligenței artificiale conversaționale (AI) pentru un program de coaching al somnului, motivat de tratamentul CBT-I. Acest proiect de doctorat își propune să dezvolte algoritmi de procesare a limbajului natural (PNL) pentru a permite sistemului să interacționeze natural cu un utilizator și să ofere sistem analitic automatizat pentru a sprijini experții umani. În această lucrare, introducem întrebări de cercetare aflate în trei faze ale programului de coaching al somnului: triaging, monitorizarea progresului și furnizarea de coaching. Ne așteptăm ca rezultatele acestui proiect de cercetare să contribuie la domeniile de cercetare ale PNL și AI, dar și în domeniul sănătății, oferind o soluție mai accesibilă și accesibilă pentru tratamentul somnului și un sistem analitic automatizat pentru a reduce povara experților umani.', 'ta': "கிட்டத்தட்ட 30% உலகின் பெரிய மக்கள் அனுபவிக்கிறார்கள் அல்லது தீவிரமான அனுபவத்தை அனுபவிக்கிறார்கள். குறிப்பிட்ட செயல்பாடு சிகிச்சை (CBT-I) அது மிகவும் பயனுள்ள சிகிச்சையாகும், ஆனால் அணுகல் மற்றும் கிடைக்கும் எல்லைகள் உள்ளன. தொழில்நுட்பத்தை பயன்படுத்துவது சாத்தியமான தீர்வு இந்த பிரச்சனையை நிர்வகிக்க, நாம் ஒரு PhD திட்டத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், ஒரு தூக்கம் பயிற்சி நிரலில் சிபிடி-I சிகிச்சை மூலம் தேவைப்படும்  இந்த PhD திட்டத்திற்கு இயற்கையான மொழி செயல்படுத்தல் (NLP) முறைமைகளை உருவாக்குவதற்கு முறைமையை இயற்கையாக ஒரு பயனருடன் இணைப்பு மற்றும் மனித வி இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் தூக்கம் பயிற்சி நிரலின் மூன்று வகுப்பின் கீழ் கொண்டுள்ள ஆராய்ச்சி கேள்விகளை அறிவிக்கிறோம We expect this research project's outcomes could contribute to the research domains of NLP and AI but also the healthcare field by providing a more accessible and affordable sleep treatment solution and an automated analytic system to lessen the burden of human experts.", 'ur': 'دنیا میں تقریباً 30% بڑھنے والوں کا تجربہ ہے یا بے حیائی کا تجربہ ہے۔ بے حیائی کے لئے (CBT-I) معلوم رفتار تراپی سب سے اثر دینے والی تراپی ہے، لیکن اس کے پاس دستیابی اور موجودگی کی حدیں ہیں. ٹیکنالوجی استعمال کرنے کا ایک ممکن حل ہے، لیکن موجود طریقے کی مکالمانی الگوں کو غافل کرتے ہیں، جو نیند ترافی میں ایک ضروری رول لگا رہی ہے. اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں ہم ایک PhD پروژہ کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو ایک نیند کوچینگ پروگرامی کے لئے مکانٹیونٹی کارٹیفی بصیرت (AI) کی استعدادوں کی تحقیق کرتی ہے جو CBT-I کے ذریعہ منتخب ہوتی ہے. This PhD project aims to develop natural language processing (NLP) algorithms to allow the system to naturally interact with a user and provide automated analytic system to support human experts. اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے سونے کی کوچینگ پروگرامی کے تین مرحلے کے اندر تحقیق سوالیں پیش کیں: تریسینگ، پیشرفت کی نظارت، اور تریسینگ کے ساتھ۔ ہم اس تحقیق پروژہ کے نتائج کا انتظار کریں گے کہ NLP اور AI کے تحقیق دامنین میں اضافہ کرسکیں، لیکن وہاں بھی سلامتی حفاظت کے مطابق ایک زیادہ دسترسی اور قابل دسترسی نیند درمانی حل کے ذریعے اور ایک آٹوٹی تحلیل سیستم کے ذریعے انسان کے متخصص لوگوں کا بو', 'vi': "Gần 30='của người lớn trên thế giới đang trải nghiệm hay có kinh nghiệm mất ngủ. Bệnh về hành vi nhận thức chữa mất ngủ là một trong những cách chữa trị hiệu quả nhất, nhưng nó có giới hạn về khả năng có thể. Sử dụng công nghệ là một trong những giải pháp có thể, nhưng các phương pháp hiện có bỏ qua các khía cạnh đối thoại, đóng một vai trò quan trọng trong việc điều trị ngủ. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề nghị một dự án Tiến sĩ khám phá tiềm năng phát triển trí tuệ nhân tạo để sử dụng một chương trình huấn luyện ngủ, động cơ do CBT-I điều trị. Dự án Tiến sĩ triết học này nhằm phát triển thuật to án ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (NLP) để cho phép hệ thống tương tác tự nhiên với người dùng và cung cấp hệ thống phân tích tự động hỗ trợ chuyên gia. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đưa ra các câu hỏi nghiên cứu nằm trong ba giai đoạn của chương trình huấn luyện ngủ: kiểm tra, theo dõi tiến trình và huấn luyện tập. Chúng tôi hy vọng kết quả của dự án nghiên cứu này có thể đóng góp cho lĩnh vực nghiên cứu của Njala và Al, nhưng cũng là lĩnh vực chăm s óc y tế bằng cách cung cấp một giải pháp ngủ dễ dàng và một hệ thống phân tích tự động để giảm gánh nặng cho các chuyên gia về người.", 'uz': "Ko'pchilik dunyodagi o'smirlarning 30% ko'p o'smirlarini ko'rganadi yoki insonlarni ko'rganadi. Kognitiv xuddiy harakat (CBT-I) eng katta ishlab chiqaruvchidan biri, lekin bu qobilish va qobiliyat uchun chegaralar bor. Teknoloqni ishlatish muvaffaqiyatli usullardan biri, lekin mavjud usullar bilan muloqotlar bilan hech qachon emas. Bu uy tizimda muhim rollen o'ynaladi. Bu muammo bilan murojaat qilish uchun, biz chaqaloqlarning rasmiy intellektlarni (AI) yaratish imkoniyatlarini o'rganish imkoniyatlarini boshqarish uchun PhD loyihasi talab qilamiz. Bu PhD loyihasi oddiy tilni boshqarish (NLP) algoritlarini yaratish uchun tizimni foydalanuvchi bilan aloqa qilish va oddiy analytik tizimni qoʻllash uchun avtomatik analytik tizimni yaratish mumkin. Bu qogʻozda, biz uyqub tahrirlash dasturdagi uchta darajada o'rganish savollarini anglatamiz: taqdim qilish, davom etish, taʼminlovchi soʻzni nazorat qilish va taʼminlovchi qilish. Biz bu taʼminlovchi projektning natijalari NLP va AI ta'minlovchi domenega qo'shish mumkin, balki qo'shimcha tibbiy soʻzni qo'shish uchun qo'llanmagan va qo'llanmalarning yuqori tizimini kamaytirish uchun qo'llanmagan foydalanuvchi tizimga qo'shiladi.", 'bg': 'Почти 30% от възрастното население в света изпитва или изпитва безсъние. Терапията за когнитивно поведение при безсъние е едно от най-ефективните лечения, но има ограничения на достъпността и достъпността. Използването на технологии е едно от възможните решения, но съществуващите методи пренебрегват разговорните аспекти, които играят критична роля в сънната терапия. За да се справим с този проблем, предлагаме докторски проект, който изследва потенциалите за развитие на разговорен изкуствен интелект (ИИ) за програма за трениране на съня, която е мотивирана от лечение на КБТ-И. Този докторски проект има за цел да разработи алгоритми за обработка на естествения език (НЛП), които да позволят на системата да взаимодейства естествено с потребителя и да осигури автоматизирана аналитична система в подкрепа на човешките експерти. В тази статия представяме изследователски въпроси, разположени в три фази на програмата за коучинг на съня: триагиране, мониторинг на напредъка и осигуряване на коучинг. Очакваме резултатите от този изследователски проект да допринесат за научноизследователските области на НЛП и изкуствения интелект, но също и за областта на здравеопазването, като предоставят по-достъпно и достъпно решение за лечение на съня и автоматизирана аналитична система за намаляване на тежестта на човешките експерти.', 'nl': 'Bijna 30% van de volwassen bevolking in de wereld ervaart of ervaart slapeloosheid. Cognitieve Gedragstherapie voor slapeloosheid (CBT-I) is een van de meest effectieve behandelingen, maar heeft beperkingen op toegankelijkheid en beschikbaarheid. Het gebruik van technologie is een van de mogelijke oplossingen, maar bestaande methoden negeren gespreksaspecten, wat een cruciale rol speelt in slaaptherapie. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, stellen we een promotieproject voor dat de mogelijkheden onderzoekt om conversational artificial intelligence (AI) te ontwikkelen voor een slaapcoaching programma, dat wordt gemotiveerd door CBT-I behandeling. Dit PhD project heeft tot doel natuurlijke taalverwerking (NLP) algoritmen te ontwikkelen om het systeem in staat te stellen om op natuurlijke wijze met een gebruiker te communiceren en een geautomatiseerd analytisch systeem te bieden om menselijke experts te ondersteunen. In dit artikel introduceren we onderzoeksvragen die in drie fasen van het slaapcoachingsprogramma liggen: triaging, monitoring van de voortgang en coaching. We verwachten dat de resultaten van dit onderzoeksproject kunnen bijdragen aan de onderzoeksdomeinen NLP en AI, maar ook aan de gezondheidszorg door een toegankelijkere en betaalbare slaapbehandelingsoplossing en een geautomatiseerd analytisch systeem te bieden om de last van menselijke experts te verminderen.', 'da': 'Næsten 30% af den voksne befolkning i verden oplever eller oplever søvnløshed. Kognitiv adfærdsterapi mod søvnløshed (CBT-I) er en af de mest effektive behandlinger, men den har begrænsninger på tilgængelighed og tilgængelighed. Brug af teknologi er en af de mulige løsninger, men eksisterende metoder forsømmer samtaleelementer, som spiller en afgørende rolle i søvnterapi. For at løse dette spørgsmål foreslår vi et ph.d.-projekt, der undersøger potentialet i at udvikle conversational kunstig intelligens (AI) til et søvncoaching program, der er motiveret af CBT-I behandling. Dette ph.d.-projekt har til formål at udvikle algoritmer til naturlig sprogbehandling (NLP) for at gøre det muligt for systemet at interagere naturligt med en bruger og levere automatiseret analytisk system til at støtte menneskelige eksperter. I denne artikel introducerer vi forskningsspørgsmål, der ligger under tre faser af søvncoachingprogrammet: triaging, overvågning af fremskridt og coaching. Vi forventer, at resultaterne af dette forskningsprojekt kan bidrage til forskningsområderne NLP og AI, men også sundhedssektoren ved at levere en mere tilgængelig og overkommelig søvnbehandlingsløsning og et automatiseret analysesystem til at mindske byrden for menneskelige eksperter.', 'hr': 'Skoro 30% odrasle populacije na svijetu iskusiva ili ima iskustvo nesanice. Terapija kognitivnog ponašanja za nesanicu (CBT-I) je jedna od najučinkovitijih liječenja, ali ima ograničenja pristupnosti i dostupnosti. Koristivanje tehnologije je jedna od mogućih rješenja, ali postojeće metode zanemaruju razgovorne aspekte, koje imaju kritičnu ulogu u terapiji spavanja. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja predlažemo projekt doktora koji istražuje potencijale razvoja razgovorne umjetne inteligencije (AI) za program treninga spavanja, koji je motiviran liječenjem CBT-I. Ovaj projekt doktorata ima cilj razviti algoritme prirodnog obrade jezika (NLP) kako bi sustav omogućio prirodno interakciju s korisnikom i pružio automatski analitički sustav za podršku ljudskih stručnjaka. U ovom papiru predstavljamo istraživačka pitanja koja leži ispod tri faze programa treninga spavanja: ispitivanje, praćenje napreda i pružanje treninga. Očekujemo da bi rezultati ovog projekta istraživanja mogli doprinijeti istraživanju područja NLP i AI-a, ali i zdravstvenom polju pružajući dostupnije i dostupnije rješenje liječenja spavanja i automatski analitički sustav kako bi smanjili teret ljudskih stručnjaka.', 'ko': '전 세계의 30퍼센트에 가까운 성인들이 불면증을 겪거나 겪은 적이 있다.인지행동치료불면증(CBT-I)은 가장 효과적인 치료법 중 하나이지만 접근성과 가용성에 한계가 있다.기술을 이용하는 것은 가능한 해결 방안 중의 하나이지만 기존의 방법은 대화를 소홀히 하고 대화는 수면 치료에서 중요한 역할을 한다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 CBT-I 치료로 추진되는 수면지도 프로그램을 위한 대화 인공지능(AI) 개발의 잠재력을 모색하는 박사 프로젝트를 제안했다.이 박사 프로젝트는 시스템이 사용자와 자연스럽게 상호작용할 수 있도록 자연언어처리(NLP) 알고리즘을 개발하고, 인간 전문가를 지원하기 위한 자동 분석 시스템을 제공하기 위한 것이다.본고에서 우리는 수면지도 계획의 세 가지 단계에서의 연구 문제인 분류, 모니터링 진전과 지도 제공을 소개했다.우리는 이 연구 프로젝트의 성과가 NLP와 AI의 연구 분야와 의료 보건 분야에 기여하고 인류 전문가의 부담을 덜기 위해 더욱 쉽게 얻을 수 있고 가격이 합리적인 수면 치료 솔루션과 자동화 분석 시스템을 제공할 수 있기를 바란다.', 'fa': 'تقریباً ۳۰ درصد از جمعیت بزرگسالان در جهان تجربه می کنند یا تجربه بی\u200cخواری دارد. درمانی رفتاری شناخته برای بی\u200cشناختی (CBT-I) یکی از بهترین درمانی است، ولی حدود دسترسی و دسترسی دارد. تکنولوژی استفاده کردن یکی از راه حل\u200cهای ممکن است، ولی روش\u200cهای موجود در حال حاضر از نقطه\u200cهای گفتگوی غافل می\u200cشوند، که نقطه\u200cای مهم\u200cترین در درمان خواب بازی می\u200cکند. برای حل این مسئله، ما یک پروژه دکتر پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که با تحقیق قابلیت\u200cهای توسعه اطلاعات هنری مکالمه (AI) برای برنامه آموزش خواب، که توسط درمان CBT-I تحریک شده است. این پروژه PhD هدف دارد که الگوریتم\u200cهای پردازش زبان طبیعی (NLP) را توسعه دهد تا سیستم را اجازه دهد که طبیعی با یک کاربر تعامل کند و سیستم تحلیل خودکار را برای حمایت متخصص بشر بدهد. در این کاغذ، ما سوال تحقیقات را معرفی می کنیم که در زیر سه مرحله برنامه آموزش خواب است: تحقیقات، تمرکز پیشرفت و آموزش. ما انتظار داریم نتایج این پروژه تحقیقات می\u200cتواند به محل تحقیقات NLP و AI و همچنین به محل مراقبت سلامتی با توجه به راه حل درمان خواب دسترسی\u200cتر و قابل دسترسی\u200cترین و دسترسی\u200cترین خواب و سیستم تحلیل\u200cپذیری خودکار را برای کمتر بار متخصص انسان کمتر کند', 'id': 'Almost 30% of the adult population in the world is experiencing or has experience insomnia.  Terapi Perilaku Cognitif untuk ketidak-tidur (CBT-I) adalah salah satu pengobatan yang paling efektif, tetapi memiliki batas pada aksesibilitas dan disponibilitas. Menggunakan teknologi adalah salah satu solusi yang mungkin, tapi metode yang ada mengabaikan aspek konversasi, yang bermain peran kritis dalam terapi tidur. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami mengusulkan proyek dokter yang mengeksplorasi potensi mengembangkan intelijen buatan konversasi (AI) untuk program pelatih tidur, yang dimotivasi oleh pengobatan CBT-I. Proyek dokter ini bertujuan untuk mengembangkan algoritma proses bahasa alam (NLP) untuk memungkinkan sistem untuk berinteraksi secara alami dengan pengguna dan menyediakan sistem analitis otomatis untuk mendukung ahli manusia. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan pertanyaan penelitian berbaring di bawah tiga fase program pelatihan tidur: triaging, mengawasi kemajuan, dan menyediakan pelatihan. Kami mengharapkan hasil proyek penelitian ini dapat berkontribusi ke bidang penelitian NLP dan AI tetapi juga bidang perawatan kesehatan dengan menyediakan solusi perawatan tidur yang lebih akses dan cenderung dan sistem analitis otomatis untuk mengurangi beban para ahli manusia.', 'de': 'Fast 30% der erwachsenen Bevölkerung der Welt leidet an Schlaflosigkeit oder leidet an Schlaflosigkeit. Kognitive Verhaltenstherapie bei Schlaflosigkeit (CBT-I) ist eine der effektivsten Behandlungen, hat jedoch Einschränkungen in Bezug auf Zugänglichkeit und Verfügbarkeit. Der Einsatz von Technologie ist eine der möglichen Lösungen, aber bestehende Methoden vernachlässigen Gesprächsaspekte, die in der Schlaftherapie eine entscheidende Rolle spielen. Um dieses Problem anzugehen, schlagen wir ein Promotionsprojekt vor, das Potenziale der Entwicklung künstlicher Intelligenz (KI) für ein Schlafcoaching-Programm untersucht, das durch CBT-I-Behandlung motiviert wird. Dieses Doktoratsprojekt zielt darauf ab, Algorithmen zur Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache (NLP) zu entwickeln, die es dem System ermöglichen, auf natürliche Weise mit einem Benutzer zu interagieren und ein automatisiertes Analysesystem zur Unterstützung menschlicher Experten bereitzustellen. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir Forschungsfragen vor, die in drei Phasen des Schlafcoaching-Programms liegen: Triaging, Monitoring des Fortschritts und Coaching. Wir gehen davon aus, dass die Ergebnisse dieses Forschungsprojekts zu den Forschungsbereichen NLP und KI, aber auch zum Gesundheitswesen beitragen könnten, indem sie eine zugänglichere und erschwinglichere Schlafbehandlungslösung und ein automatisiertes Analysesystem bereitstellen, um die Belastung menschlicher Experten zu verringern.', 'sw': 'Karibu asilimia 30 ya watu wazima duniani wanakabiliwa au wanakabiliwa na uvunjifu. Utata wa kitendo kinachofahamu kwa ajili ya uvunjifu (CBT-I) ni moja ya matibabu yenye ufanisi zaidi, lakini ina vizuizi vya upatikanaji na upatikanaji. Utumiaji wa teknolojia ni moja ya suluhisho linalowezekana, lakini njia zilizopo hupuuza mambo ya mazungumzo, ambayo inacheza nafasi muhimu katika matibabu ya kulala. Ili kukabiliana na suala hili, tunapendekeza mradi wa PhD kutafuta uwezekano wa kuendeleza maarifa ya kisasa ya mazungumzo (AI) kwa mpango wa treni wa kulala, ambao unahamasishwa na matibabu ya CBT-I. Mradi huu wa PhD unalenga kuendeleza algorithi za utaratibu wa lugha asilia (NLP) ili kuiruhusu mfumo wa kuingiliana na mtumiaji na kutoa mfumo wa uchambuzi wa kujitegemea kuwasaidia wataalam wa binadamu. Katika karatasi hii, tunaonyesha maswali ya utafiti yanayowekwa chini ya hatua tatu ya mpango wa treni wa kulala: kutengeneza uzee, kufuatilia maendeleo, na kutoa mafunzo. Tunatarajia matokeo ya mradi wa utafiti huu yanaweza kusaidia katika maeneo ya utafiti wa NLP na AI lakini pia kwenye eneo la afya kwa kutoa suluhisho la kupatikana zaidi na kupatikana kwa matibabu ya kulala pamoja na mfumo wa uchambuzi unaoaminika mzigo wa wataalam wa binadamu.', 'sq': 'Pothuajse 30% e popullsisë së rritur në botë është duke përjetuar apo ka përjetuar insomni. Behaviour Cognitive Therapy for insomnia (CBT-I) is one of the most effective treatment, but it has limitations on accessibility and availability. Përdorimi i teknologjisë është një nga zgjidhjet e mundshme, por metodat ekzistuese harrojnë aspektet bisedimore, që luajnë një rol kritik në terapinë e gjumit. Për të trajtuar këtë çështje, ne propozojmë një projekt doktorator që eksploron potencialet e zhvillimit të inteligjencës artificiale bisedimore (AI) për një program trajnimi gjumi, i cili është i motivuar nga trajtimi CBT-I. Ky projekt PhD synon të zhvillojë algoritme të procesimit natyror të gjuhës (NLP) për të lejuar sistemin të ndërveprojë natyralisht me një përdorues dhe të ofrojë sistem analitik automatik për të mbështetur ekspertët njerëzorë. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim pyetje kërkimi që gjenden nën tre faza të programit të trajnimit të gjumit: triaging, mbikqyrje e përparimit dhe ofrimin e trajnimit. Ne presim që rezultatet e këtij projekti kërkimor mund të kontribuojnë në fushat e kërkimit të NLP dhe AI por gjithashtu fushën e kujdesit shëndetësor duke ofruar një zgjidhje më të mundshme dhe më të pranueshme trajtimi të gjumit dhe një sistem analitik automatik për të zvogëluar barrën e ekspertëve njerëzorë.', 'am': 'በዓለም ያሉት የሆኑት 30 በመቶ ዕድሜ መፍታት ወይም መፍታትን አግኝተዋል፡፡ የውይይት ሁኔታ ለመፍታት (CBT-I) ከታዋቂው ትምህርት አንዱ ነው፤ ግን ለመግኘት እና ለመግኘት ግንኙነት አለበት። ቴክሎጂን በመጠቀም የሚቻለው መፍትሄ አንዲት ነው፤ ነገር ግን የሚኖሩት ሥርዓቶች በአንቀላፋት ትምህርት ማሰናከል ነው፡፡ ለዚህ ጉዳይ ለመቀበል የPhD ፕሮጀክት፣ CBT-I ተግባር የተመሳሳይ የአንቀላፋዊ የኢንተርኔት ማስታወቂያውን (AI) ለመፍጠር የሚችሉትን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ይህ አዲስ ፕሮጀክት የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ (NLP) መግለጫ ማድረግ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም ከሦስት ደረጃዎች በታች የምንመረምር ጥያቄዎችን እናስጠይቃለን፡፡ የዚህን ትምህርት ፕሮጀክት ውጤቶች የNLP እና AI ምርምር አዳራሽ ሊሆን ይችላል፣ ነገር ግን የደኅንነትን ጤና መፍታት መፍታት እና የሰው አዋቂዎችን ሸክም ለማጎድል የሚችል እና የተቻለ የአንቀላፋዊ መፍትሄ ማድረግ እና የተመሳሳይ አስተያየት ስርዓት ማድረግ እና የፍ', 'tr': 'Dünýäde ýetginjek adamlaryň 30%-yna haçan tejribe ýa-da hiç zat ýok. Azsyzlyk üçin bilinç tertibisi (CBT-I) iň hili täsirli tedavidir, ýöne onuň erişilebilirlik we ýeterlikli hüdudlarynyň bardyr. Tehnologiýany ulanmak mümkin çözgütlerden biri, ýöne bar ýaly çözümlerden söhbetçilik aspektlerini boýun gaçyrýar. Bu uyku terapiýasynda has möhüm roli oýnaýar. Bu meselede çözmek üçin, CBT-I terapy tarapyndan örän gürrüňli sagat okuwçylary (AI) üçin PhD projesini teklip berýäris. Bu PhD projesi tebigy dil işlemegini (NLP) algoritmalaryny sistemiň bir ullançy bilen täze bir hereket edip, adamlary ekspertlerini desteklemek üçin otomatik analitik sistemini tassyklamak maksady. Bu kagyzda, uzak kowçylyk programynyň üç sahypalarynda araşdyrma soraglaryny tanyşdyrýarys: denemek, ilerleme gözlemek we öwrenmek üçin taýýarlamak. Biz bu ylmy taslaýyşyň netijesi NLP we AI-yň barlama alanlaryna kömekleşer diýip pikir edýäris ýöne saglyk alanlary hem elýeterli we elýeterli uyku tedavisi çözümlerini we adamlaryň ýagdaýyny azaltmak üçin awtomatik analytik sistemasyna kömekleşer.', 'af': "Omtrent 30% van die grootste bevolking in die wêreld is deursien of het erfaring onsamenes. Kognitiewe Gedrag Terapie vir insomnie (CBT-I) is een van die mees effektief behandeling, maar dit het beperking op toeganklikheid en beskikbaarheid. Gebruik teknologie is een van die moontlike oplossing, maar bestaande metodes verwerp omskakelaspekte wat 'n kritiese rol speel in slaap terapie. Om hierdie probleem te raak, voorstel ons 'n PhD-projek wat potensieele van die ontwikkeling van konversasionale kunstenaar inteligensie (AI) vir 'n slaap onderwerking program, wat deur CBT-I-behandeling motiveer word. Hierdie PhD-projek doel doen om natuurlike taal-prosessering (NLP) algoritme te ontwikkel om die stelsel te laat natuurlik interaksie met 'n gebruiker en outomatiese analitiese stelsel te verskaf om menslike eksperte te ondersteun. In hierdie papier, introduseer ons onder drie fase van die slaap onderwerp program: probeer, monitoreer die vordering en onderwerp. Ons verwag dat die resultate van hierdie ondersoek projek kan bydra a an die ondersoek domene van NLP en AI, maar ook die gesondsverkomste veld deur 'n meer toeganklik en beskikbaar slaap behandeling oplossing en 'n outomatiese analytiese stelsel te verskaf om die las van menslike eksperte te verminder.", 'hy': "Almost 30% of the adult population in the world is experiencing or has experience insomnia.  Անքնելի ճանաչողական վարքագիծի թերապիան (ԿԲԹ-I) ամենաարդյունավետ բուժումներից մեկն է, բայց այն սահմանափակում է հասանելիությունը և հասանելիությունը: Utilising technology is one of the possible solutions, but existing methods neglect conversational aspects, which plays a critical role in sleep therapy.  Այս հարցին լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք դոկտորական ծրագիր, որը ուսումնասիրում է խոսակցական արհեստական ինտելեկտը (ԱԲ) զարգացման պոտենցիալը քնի վարժեցման ծրագրի համար, որը հիմնված է ՔԲԹ-I բուժումով: Այս դոկտորական ծրագիրը նպատակն է զարգացնել բնական լեզվի վերամշակման ալգորիթմներ, որպեսզի համակարգը կարողանա բնական շփվել օգտագործողի հետ և ապահովել ավտոմատիկ վերլուծության համակարգ մարդկային մասնագետների աջակցու Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք ուսումնասիրության հարցեր, որոնք գտնվում են քնի մարզիչ ծրագրի երեք փուլում' փորձարկումներ կատարելով, հետևելով առաջընթացը և տրամադրելով մարզիչ: Մենք ակնկալում ենք, որ այս ուսումնասիրության ծրագրի արդյունքները կարող են ներդրել ՆԼՊ-ի և ԱԲ-ի ուսումնասիրության ոլորտներում, ինչպես նաև առողջապահության ոլորտներում, ապահովելով ավելի հասանելի և հասանելի քնի բուժման լուծում և ավտոմատիկ վերլուծության համակարգ մարդկային", 'az': 'Dünyadakı yetişkin nüfusunun az qala 30%-i təcrübə edir, yoxsa təcrübə edir. İnsanlıq üçün Cognitive Behaviour Therapı (CBT-I) ən effektiv tedavilərdən biridir, amma onun əlaqəsizlik və faydalaşılıq barəsində hədləri var. Tehnologiyanı istifadə etmək mümkün çətinliklərdən biridir, amma mevcut metodlar uyku terapijasında kritik bir rol oynayır. Bu məsələdən çəkinmək üçün, CBT-I tedavisi ilə motivasiyonlu uyku təhsil programı üçün müzakirçilik sanatlı istihbaratı (AI) təhsil edən bir doktora layihəsini təklif edirik. Bu PhD layihəsi təbiətli dil işləməsi (NLP) algoritmini təmizləmək üçün sistemin istifadəçi ilə təbiətlə əlaqə etməsini və insan ekspertlərini dəstəkləmək üçün automatik analitik sistemi təmizləməsini istəyir. Bu kağızda, uyku təhsil programının üç fərz altında olan araştırma suallarını təşkil edirik: təhsil etmək, təhsil etmək və təhsil etmək. Biz bu araştırma projesinin sonuçları NLP və AI araştırma alanlarına kömək edə bilər, lakin həmçinin s a ğlam təhsil alanı daha faydalanıb, daha qabiliyyətli uyku tedavisi çətinliklərini və insanların yükünü azaltmaq üçün automatik analitik sistemi olar.', 'bn': 'প্রায় ৩০% বিশ্বের বয়স্ক জনসংখ্যার অভিজ্ঞতা বা অভিজ্ঞতা আছে। বিদ্রোহীত আচরণের (সিবিটি-I) সবচেয়ে কার্যকর চিকিৎসার অন্যতম, কিন্তু এটি প্রবেশ এবং প্রবেশের সীমাবদ্ধ। প্রযুক্তি ব্যবহার করা সম্ভাব্য সমাধানের একটি সমাধান, কিন্তু বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি আলোচনার বিষয়ের উপেক্ষা করে, যা ঘুমের চিকিৎসায় গুর এই বিষয়ে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা একটি PhD প্রকল্পের প্রস্তাব করছি যেটি একটি ঘুম কোচিং প্রোগ্রামের জন্য যা সিবিটি-I চিকিৎসা দ্বারা উৎসাহিত। এই PhD প্রকল্পের উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া (এনএলপি) অ্যালগরিদম তৈরি করা যাতে স্বাভাবিকভাবে একজন ব্যবহারকারীর সাথে যোগাযো এই কাগজটিতে আমরা গবেষণা প্রশ্নের উপস্থাপন করি যা ঘুমানো প্রোগ্রামের তিন ক্ষেত্রের অধীনে অবস্থিত রয়েছে: প্রযুক্তি, উন্নয়ন পর্যব আমরা আশা করি এই গবেষণা প্রকল্পের ফলাফল এনএলপি এবং এআই এর গবেষণার কোম্পানির কাছে সাহায্য করতে পারে, কিন্তু স্বাস্থ্যসেবা ক্ষেত্রেও আরো বেশী সহজলযোগিতা এবং ব্যবস্থা', 'bs': 'Skoro 30% odrasle populacije na svijetu iskusiva ili ima iskustvo nesanice. Terapija kognitivnog ponašanja za nesanicu (CBT-I) je jedna od najefikasnijih liječenja, ali ima ograničenja pristupnosti i dostupnosti. Koristivanje tehnologije je jedna od mogućih rješenja, ali postojeće metode zanemaruju razgovorne aspekte, koja igra kritičnu ulogu u terapiji spavanja. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja predlažemo projekt doktora koji istražuje potencijale razvoja razgovorne umjetne inteligencije (AI) za program treninga spavanja, koji je motivisan liječenjem CBT-I. Ovaj projekt doktorata ima cilj razviti algoritme prirodnog obrade jezika (NLP) kako bi sistem omogućio prirodno interakciju sa korisnikom i pružio automatski analitički sistem za podršku ljudskih stručnjaka. U ovom papiru predstavljamo istraživačka pitanja koja leži ispod tri faze programa treninga spavanja: ispitivanje, praćenje napreda i pružanje treninga. Očekujemo da bi rezultati ovog projekta istraživanja mogli doprinijeti istraživanju domena NLP i AI, ali i zdravstvenom polju pružanjem dostupnijeg i dostupnijeg rješenja liječenja spavanjem i automatskog analitičkog sistema kako bi smanjili teret ljudskih stručnjaka.', 'et': 'Peaaegu 30% maailma täiskasvanud elanikkonnast kogeb või on kogenud unetust. Unetuse kognitiivse käitumise ravi (CBT-I) on üks tõhusamaid ravimeid, kuid sellel on piiratud ligipääsetavus ja kättesaadavus. Tehnoloogia kasutamine on üks võimalikest lahendustest, kuid olemasolevad meetodid eiravad vestlusaspekte, mis mängivad uneteraapias kriitilist rolli. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks pakume välja doktoriprojekti, milles uuritakse vestlusliku tehisintellekti (AI) arendamise potentsiaale unejuhendamise programmi jaoks, mida motiveerib CBT-I ravi. Selle doktoriõppe eesmärk on arendada looduskeele töötlemise (NLP) algoritme, mis võimaldavad süsteemil loomulikult suhelda kasutajaga ja pakkuda automatiseeritud analüütilist süsteemi inimekspertide toetamiseks. Käesolevas töös tutvustame uurimisküsimusi, mis asuvad unetreeningprogrammi kolmes etapis: triaaž, edusammude jälgimine ja juhendamine. Loodame, et selle uurimisprojekti tulemused võiksid aidata kaasa NLP ja AI uurimisvaldkondadele, aga ka tervishoiuvaldkonnale, pakkudes kättesaadavamat ja taskukohasemat uneravilahendust ning automatiseeritud analüüsisüsteemi inimekspertide koormuse vähendamiseks.', 'cs': 'Téměř 30% dospělé populace na světě zažívá nebo trpí nespavostí. Kognitivní behaviorální terapie pro nespavost (CBT-I) je jednou z nejúčinnějších léčeb, ale má omezení dostupnosti a dostupnosti. Využití technologie je jedním z možných řešení, ale stávající metody zanedbávají konverzační aspekty, které hrají klíčovou roli ve spánkové terapii. Pro řešení této problematiky navrhujeme doktorský projekt zkoumající potenciály rozvoje konverzační umělé inteligence (AI) pro program spánkového koučování, který je motivován CBT-I léčbou. Tento doktorský projekt si klade za cíl vyvinout algoritmy zpracování přirozeného jazyka (NLP), které umožní systému přirozeně interagovat s uživatelem a poskytnout automatizovaný analytický systém na podporu lidských odborníků. V tomto článku představujeme výzkumné otázky spadající do tří fází programu koučování spánku: triaging, monitoring pokroku a poskytování koučování. Očekáváme, že výsledky tohoto výzkumného projektu by mohly přispět k výzkumným oblastem NLP a AI, ale také do oblasti zdravotnictví poskytnutím dostupnějšího a cenově dostupnějšího řešení léčby spánku a automatizovaného analytického systému, který sníží zátěž lidských odborníků.', 'fi': 'Lähes 30% maailman aikuisväestöstä kokee tai kokee unettomuutta. Unettomuuden kognitiivinen käyttäytymisterapia (CBT-I) on yksi tehokkaimmista hoidoista, mutta sen saavutettavuus ja saatavuus ovat rajallisia. Teknologian hyödyntäminen on yksi mahdollisista ratkaisuista, mutta olemassa olevissa menetelmissä unohdetaan keskustelunäkökohdat, joilla on ratkaiseva rooli uniterapiassa. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme tohtorihanketta, jossa tutkitaan mahdollisuuksia kehittää keskustelevaa tekoälyä univalmennusohjelmaan, jota motivoi CBT-I-hoito. Tämän PhD-projektin tavoitteena on kehittää luonnollisen kielen käsittelyalgoritmeja, joiden avulla järjestelmä voi toimia luonnollisessa vuorovaikutuksessa käyttäjän kanssa ja tarjota automatisoitu analyyttinen järjestelmä ihmisten asiantuntijoiden tueksi. Tässä työssä esitellään univalmennusohjelman kolmeen vaiheeseen liittyviä tutkimuskysymyksiä: triaging, edistymisen seuranta ja valmennuksen tarjoaminen. Odotamme, että tämän tutkimusprojektin tulokset voivat vaikuttaa NLP:n ja tekoälyn tutkimusalueisiin mutta myös terveydenhuoltoon tarjoamalla helppokäyttöisemmän ja edullisemman unihoitoratkaisun sekä automatisoidun analyysijärjestelmän ihmisten asiantuntijoiden taakan keventämiseksi.', 'ca': "Quasi el 30% de la població adulta del món està experimentant o té insomnia. Cognitive Behaviour Therapy for insomnia (CBT-I) is one of the most effective treatment, but it has limitations on accessibility and availability.  Utilitzar la tecnologia és una de les solucions possibles, però els mètodes existents ignoren aspectes conversacionals, que juguen un paper crític en la teràpia del son. Per abordar aquesta qüestió, proposem un projecte de doctorat que explori potencials de desenvolupar intel·ligència artificial conversacional (AI) per un programa d'entrenament del son, motivat pel tractament CBT-I. Aquest projecte de doctorat té l'objectiu de desenvolupar algoritmes de processament natural de llenguatges (NLP) per permetre al sistema interactuar de manera natural amb un usuari i proporcionar un sistema analític automatitzat que suporta experts humans. En aquest paper, introduïm preguntes de recerca que es troben sota tres fases del programa d'entrenament del son: triatge, supervisió del progrés i proporció d'entrenament. Esperem que els resultats d'aquest projecte de recerca puguin contribuir als domínios de recerca de NLP i AI, però també en el camp de la sanitat proporcionant una solució de tractament del son més accesible i abordable i un sistema analític automatitzat que redueixi la càrrega dels experts humans.", 'sk': 'Skoraj 30% odraslega prebivalstva na svetu doživlja ali ima nespečnost. Kognitivno vedenjsko terapijo za nespečnost (CBT-I) je eno najučinkovitejših zdravljenj, vendar ima omejitve glede dostopnosti in razpoložljivosti. Uporaba tehnologije je ena izmed možnih rešitev, vendar obstoječe metode zanemarjajo pogovorne vidike, ki igrajo ključno vlogo pri terapiji spanja. Za obravnavo tega vprašanja predlagamo doktorski projekt, ki raziskuje potenciale razvoja pogovorne umetne inteligence (AI) za program coaching spanja, ki ga motivira zdravljenje CBT-I. Namen tega doktorskega projekta je razviti algoritme za obdelavo naravnega jezika (NLP), ki omogočajo sistemu naravno interakcijo z uporabnikom in zagotavljajo avtomatiziran analitični sistem za podporo človeškim strokovnjakom. V prispevku predstavljamo raziskovalna vprašanja, ki ležijo v treh fazah programa coaching spanja: triaging, spremljanje napredka in zagotavljanje coaching. Pričakujemo, da bi rezultati tega raziskovalnega projekta lahko prispevali k raziskovalnim področjem NLP in AI, pa tudi zdravstvenemu področju z zagotavljanjem dostopnejše in cenovno dostopnejše rešitve za zdravljenje spanja ter avtomatiziranim analitičnim sistemom za zmanjšanje bremena človeških strokovnjakov.', 'ha': "Taki 30% daga mazanki da ke cikin duniya yana shagala ko yana da has ãra. Kognitive Terapy for Insurance (CBT-I) yana daga mafiya amfani masu fasahan aiki, kuma yana da ƙaddara kan accessibili da itacce. Yin amfani da Technya yana daga cikin masu yiwuwa, kuma amma metoden da ke jira, su ƙẽtare masu da mazaɓa da mazaɓa, wanda ke yi wani rabo na muhimu a cikin terawa na barci. To da za mu yi addu'a ga wannan masu al'amarin, za'a buɗa wata PhD-Projem da Muke ƙarfafa masu iya utoan mataimaki na danne ma'abũcin aiki na bakwai (AI) zuwa wata programme mai coaching na barci, wanda ake kwaɗaitar da CBT-I. Wannan PhD-Projekt na aimar ya buɗe algoritori na takardar aiki na asili (NLP) don ya yarda a haɗe na'ura da amfani da mai amfani da shi a natura, kuma ya bãyar da tsarin analyta farat ɗaya dõmin ya ƙarfafa masu sani. Daga wannan takardan, Munã ƙara masu tambayar fitina a ƙarƙasan wata na shiryoyin barci uku-fasa: masu cire, kuma masu tsari tabar gabatar da kuma ke sami mafiya. Tuna ƙaunar cẽwa matsalar wannan fitina ɗin zai iya ƙara zuwa ma'anar research na NLP da AI, amma da kuma field na zartar da zartar zartar zartar zartar zartar zartarwa na kafin mutane da za'a iya sauƙa ƙa masu amfani da masu daidaiwa wa barci da kuma an sami wata na'anatarwa farat ɗaya dõmin ya ƙara nauyi na masu sani.", 'he': "כמעט 30% מאוכלוסיית הבוגרים בעולם חווים או יש לה חוויה של insomnia. טיפול התנהגות הקונטיבית לנישום (CBT-I) הוא אחד הטיפול הכי יעיל, אך יש לו מגבלות על גישה והזמינות. השימוש בטכנולוגיה הוא אחד הפתרונות האפשריים, אך שיטות קיימות זנחו את היבטים השיחתיים, אשר משחק תפקיד קריטי בטיפול לישון. כדי להתמודד עם הנושא הזה, אנו מציעים פרויקט דוקטורט חוקר פוטנציאל לפיתוח אינטליגנציה מלאכותית משיחה (AI) לתוכנית מאמן שינה, שממוטיבציה על ידי טיפול CBT-I. פרויקט הדוקטורט הזה מכוון לפתח אלגוריתמים של עיבוד שפת טבעית (NLP) כדי לאפשר למערכת להתקשר באופן טבעי עם משתמש ולספק מערכת אנליטית אוטומטית לתמוך במומחים אנושיים. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים שאלות מחקר שוכבות תחת שלושה שלבים של תוכנית המאמן לישון: ניתוח, מעקב על התקדמות, וספק המאמן. We expect this research project's outcomes could contribute to the research domains of NLP and AI but also the healthcare field by providing a more accessible and affordable sleep treatment solution and an automated analytic system to lessen the burden of human experts.", 'jv': 'Siji 30% sing uwong maneh ning dunya iki dadi nêmên yakune sakjané apa. Awakdhéh Pangan Cogénatis Terapit kanggo nesênêr (BBT-I) iki sing wong liyane sing gak nêmên efek kanggo ndelaké, nguasai iki dadi limitasi kanggo ndelaké karo akeh operasi. Packages Ngawe nggunakake pertualisi iki, nggunakake pertualisi ingkang dipunangé artiksel artiksel (AI) kanggo program sing kudu nggawe ngucap, sing bisa ngucap pertualisi nggawe sawar bantuan. Proyek Doktor iki arêp nggawe Algorithm kanggo nggawe aturan kapomotan ingkang (NLP) kanggo nyebah sistem kanggo kejahatan aturan sak nguasakno karo pengguna sistem tah sênêm urip lan akeh automatik sistem kanggo nggunakaé perbudhakan pengguna sak barêng. Nang mapun iki, kita mulai perusahaan langkung pawaran sak sabanjur ing cadang telu phase nan sakjane panjenengan nggawe nguasal: ngilanggar, ngilanggar urip nggawe, ngono nggawe urip. Awak dhéwé nglanggar barang nggawe perusahaan winih kanggo ingkang dipunahayé kamu pangan NLP lan AI kuwi mau, mengko awak dhèwèké keamanan luwih apik lan ora oleh operasi alam sing apik dhèwèké lan saké sampek arep gawe nguasai perusahaan winih lan sistem tah-alam sing beraksi ujaran kanggo mbeng', 'bo': 'འཛམ་གླིང་གི་སྐྱེས་པའི་མི་འབོར་སྤྱི་གྲངས་ཀྱི་གྲངས་འབོར་གསུམ་ཅིག་མཉམ་དུ་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའམ། མི་ཤེས་ཀྱི་བྱ་སྤྱོད་སྒེར་གྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་ནི་ཁྱད་དུ་འཕགས་པའི་ཞལ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གཅིག་རེད། ཡིན་ནའང་དེ་ལ་འཛུལ ལག་ལེན་ཐབས་ལམ་སྤྱོད་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་འཆར་ཐུབ་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ཡིན། གནད་དོན་འདི་ལ་བསླབ་ན་ངེད་ཚོར་PhD་ལས་འགུལ་གྱིས་གཏམ་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་གཏོང་གི་ནུས་པ་གཤིས་ཀྱི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཞིག་གནང་བ་རེད། PhD་ལས་འགུལ་འདིས་རང་བཞིན་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སྒོ་ལས་གླེང་མོལ་གྱི་གནད་མེད་དུ་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་རྗེས་སུ་འབྲངས་ཆེན་ཡོད་པའི་NLP དང་AI འི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་གནས་ས།'}
{'en': 'Relating Relations : Meta-Relation Extraction from Online Health Forum Posts', 'fr': 'Relation des relations\xa0: Extraction de méta-relations à partir des messages du forum de santé', 'ar': 'العلاقات المتعلِّقة: استخراج العلاقات الفوقية من مشاركات منتدى الصحة عبر الإنترنت', 'es': 'Relaciones relacionadas: extracción de meta-relaciones de publicaciones en foros de salud en línea', 'zh': '相关:取元于在线论坛帖', 'ja': '関連関係：オンラインヘルスフォーラムの投稿からのメタ関連抽出', 'pt': 'Relações Relacionadas: Extração de Meta-Relação de Postagens do Fórum de Saúde Online', 'hi': 'संबंधित संबंध: ऑनलाइन स्वास्थ्य फोरम पोस्ट से मेटा-संबंध निष्कर्षण', 'ru': 'Связанные отношения: извлечение мета-связи из сообщений онлайн-форума здравоохранения', 'ga': 'Caidreamh a Dhéanamh: Sliocht Meta-Gaol ó Phoist ar Fhóram Sláinte Ar Líne', 'el': 'Σχετικές Σχέσεις: Εκχύλισμα μετα-Σχέσεων από Δημοσιεύσεις Φόρουμ Υγείας', 'ka': 'Related Relations: Meta-Relation Extraction from Online Health Forum Posts', 'hu': 'Kapcsolati kapcsolatok: Meta-relatív kivonás az online egészségügyi fórum bejegyzéseiből', 'lt': 'Santykiai: Metasantykių ekstrahavimas iš interneto sveikatos forumo pareigūnų', 'kk': 'Сәйкес қатынастары: Онлайн саулық форумынан мета- қатынастарды тарқату', 'it': 'Relating Relations: Estrazione di Meta-Relation da Online Health Forum Posts', 'mk': 'Врзани односи: Екстракција на мета-односи од онлајн форумот за здравство', 'ml': 'ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു: മെറ്റ- Relation Extraction from Online Health Forum Posts', 'mt': "Relazzjonijiet Relativi: Estrazzjoni ta' Meta-Relazzjonijiet mill-Karigi tal-Forum tas-Saħħa Online", 'ms': 'Relating Relations: Meta-Relation Extraction from Online Health Forum Posts', 'mn': 'Хамааралтай харилцаа: Онлайн эрүүл мэндийн форумын захирагдлын мета-харилцаа', 'no': 'Relative relasjonar: Utpakking av metarelasjonar frå online helseforum post', 'pl': 'Related Relations: Ekstrakcja metarelacji z Online Health Forum Posts', 'ro': 'Relații relaționale: Extracția metarelației din Forumul de Sănătate Online Postări', 'sr': 'Relativne odnose: ekstrakcija metaodnosa iz postaja online zdravstvenog foruma', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධතාවක්: මෙටා- සම්බන්ධතාවක් අන්ලයින් ස්වාස්ත්\u200dය පෝස්ට්ස් වලින් පිට', 'so': 'xiriirka: Meta-Relation Extraction from Online Health Forum Posts', 'sv': 'Relativa relationer: Meta-Relation Extraktion från Online Health Forum Inlägg', 'ta': 'Relating Relations: Meta-Relation Extraction from Online Health Forum Posts', 'ur': 'Relating Relations: Meta-Relation Extraction from Online Health Forum Posts', 'vi': 'Quan hệ liên quan: chiết xuất từ các bưu kiện môi trường trực tuyến', 'uz': 'Aloqalar: Meta-Relation Extraction from Online Health Forum Posts', 'da': 'Relaterede relationer: Meta-Relation Ekstraktion fra Online Health Forum Indlæg', 'nl': 'Relatie Relaties: Meta-Relatie Extractie uit Online Health Forum Posts', 'hr': 'Relativni odnosi: izvlačenje metaodnosa iz postaja online zdravstvenog foruma', 'bg': 'Отношения: извличане на мета-връзка от публикации в онлайн здравния форум', 'de': 'Verwandte Beziehungen: Meta-Relation Extraktion aus Online Health Forum Beiträge', 'ko': '연관 관계: 온라인 건강 포럼 게시물에서 메타 관계 추출', 'id': 'Hubungan Hubungan: Ekstraksi Meta-Hubungan dari Posts Forum Kesehatan Online', 'fa': 'رابطه\u200cهای ارتباط: اخراج مترابطه از پوست\u200cهای فورم سلامتی آنلاین', 'af': 'Relatiewe Relasies: Meta-Relasie Uitpakking van Online Health Forum Posts', 'tr': 'Görniş baglaýyşlar:', 'sw': 'Kuhusiana na uhusiano: Utoa wa Meta kutoka Jukwaa la Afya Mtandaoni', 'am': 'Meta-Relation Extraction from Online Health Forum Posts', 'sq': 'Marrëdhëniet e lidhura: Ekstraktimi i Meta-Marrëdhënieve nga postimet e Forumit të Shëndetësisë në internet', 'az': 'Related Relations: Meta-Relational Extraction from Online Health Forum Posts', 'bn': 'সম্পর্ক সম্পর্ক: অনলাইন স্বাস্থ্য ফোরাম থেকে মেটা সম্পর্ক', 'bs': 'Relativni odnosi: ekstrakcija metaodnosa iz postaja online zdravstvenog foruma', 'hy': 'Կապուր հարաբերությունները. Մետահարաբերությունների արտահանումը առողջապահության առցանց ֆորմում տեղադրված տեղադրություններից', 'cs': 'Související vztahy: Extrakce metavztahů z online zdravotního fóra Příspěvky', 'et': 'Suhted: Meta-suhe väljavõte Online Tervisefoorumi postitustest', 'ca': 'Relacions relacionades: Extracció de meta-relacions de publicacions del Foro de Saúde en línia', 'fi': 'Relating Relations: Meta-Relation Extract Online Health Forum Posts', 'he': 'מערכות יחסים: מחלקת מערכות יחסים מתוך פורם בריאות באינטרנט', 'ha': 'Meta-Relation Extraction from Online Head Forum Posts', 'sk': 'Relating Relations: Meta-Relation Extraction iz prispevkov spletnega zdravstvenega foruma', 'bo': 'འབྲེལ་བ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ། དྲ་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་སྐྱེས་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཕྱིར་འཐེན་བྱེད།', 'jv': 'Relations'}
{'en': 'Relation extraction is a key task in knowledge extraction, and is commonly defined as the task of identifying relations that hold between entities in text. This thesis proposal addresses the specific task of identifying meta-relations, a higher order family of relations naturally construed as holding between other relations which includes temporal, comparative, and causal relations. More specifically, we aim to develop theoretical underpinnings and practical solutions for the challenges of (1) incorporating meta-relations into conceptualisations and annotation schemes for (lower-order) relations and named entities, (2) obtaining annotations for them with tolerable cognitive load on annotators, (3) creating models capable of reliably extracting meta-relations, and related to that (4) addressing the limited-data problem exacerbated by the introduction of meta-relations into the learning task. We explore recent works in relation extraction and discuss our plans to formally conceptualise meta-relations for the domain of user-generated health texts, and create a new dataset, annotation scheme and models for meta-relation extraction.', 'fr': "L'extraction de relations est une tâche clé dans l'extraction de connaissances et est généralement définie comme la tâche d'identifier les relations qui existent entre des entités dans un texte. Cette proposition de thèse aborde la tâche spécifique d'identifier les méta-relations, une famille de relations d'ordre supérieur naturellement interprétée comme tenant entre d'autres relations, y compris les relations temporelles, comparatives et causales. Plus spécifiquement, nous visons à développer des bases théoriques et des solutions pratiques aux défis de (1) l'intégration des méta-relations dans les conceptualisations et les schémas d'annotation pour les relations (d'ordre inférieur) et les entités nommées, (2) l'obtention d'annotations pour celles-ci avec une charge cognitive tolérable sur annotateurs, (3) créant des modèles capables d'extraire de manière fiable des méta-relations, et liés à cela (4) abordant le problème des données limitées exacerbé par l'introduction de méta-relations dans la tâche d'apprentissage. Nous explorons des travaux récents sur l'extraction de relations et discutons de nos plans pour conceptualiser formellement les méta-relations dans le domaine des textes de santé générés par les utilisateurs, et créer un nouveau jeu de données, un nouveau schéma d'annotation et des modèles pour l'extraction de méta-relations.", 'es': 'La extracción de relaciones es una tarea clave en la extracción de conocimiento, y se define comúnmente como la tarea de identificar las relaciones que se mantienen entre entidades en el texto. Esta propuesta de tesis aborda la tarea específica de identificar meta-relaciones, una familia de relaciones de orden superior que se interpreta naturalmente como un mantenimiento entre otras relaciones que incluyen relaciones temporales, comparativas y causales. Más específicamente, nuestro objetivo es desarrollar bases teóricas y soluciones prácticas para los desafíos de (1) incorporar meta-relaciones en conceptualizaciones y esquemas de anotación para relaciones (de orden inferior) y entidades nombradas, (2) obtener anotaciones para ellas con una carga cognitiva tolerable en anotadores, (3) crear modelos capaces de extraer metarrelaciones de manera confiable, y relacionados con eso (4) abordar el problema de datos limitados exacerbado por la introducción de meta-relaciones en la tarea de aprendizaje. Exploramos trabajos recientes en la extracción de relaciones y discutimos nuestros planes para conceptualizar formalmente las meta-relaciones para el dominio de los textos de salud generados por los usuarios, y crear un nuevo conjunto de datos, esquema de anotación y modelos para la extracción de meta-relaciones.', 'ar': 'يعد استخراج العلاقات مهمة أساسية في استخراج المعرفة ، ويتم تعريفه بشكل عام على أنه مهمة تحديد العلاقات التي تربط بين الكيانات في النص. يتناول مقترح الأطروحة هذا المهمة المحددة المتمثلة في تحديد العلاقات الفوقية ، وهي مجموعة علاقات ذات رتبة أعلى يتم تفسيرها بشكل طبيعي على أنها عقد بين العلاقات الأخرى التي تتضمن العلاقات الزمنية والمقارنة والسببية. وبشكل أكثر تحديدًا ، نهدف إلى تطوير الأسس النظرية والحلول العملية لتحديات (1) دمج العلاقات الوصفية في التصورات المفاهيمية ومخططات التعليقات التوضيحية للعلاقات (ذات الترتيب الأدنى) والكيانات المسماة ، (2) الحصول على التعليقات التوضيحية لهم مع عبء معرفي مقبول في التعليقات التوضيحية ، (3) إنشاء نماذج قادرة على استخراج العلاقات الوصفية بشكل موثوق ، والمتعلقة بذلك (4) معالجة مشكلة البيانات المحدودة التي تفاقمت بسبب إدخال العلاقات الوصفية في مهمة التعلم. نستكشف الأعمال الحديثة المتعلقة باستخراج العلاقة ونناقش خططنا لوضع تصور رسمي للعلاقات الوصفية لمجال النصوص الصحية التي ينشئها المستخدم ، وإنشاء مجموعة بيانات جديدة ومخطط شرح ونماذج لاستخراج العلاقات الوصفية.', 'pt': 'A extração de relações é uma tarefa chave na extração de conhecimento e é comumente definida como a tarefa de identificar as relações que mantêm entre entidades no texto. Esta proposta de tese aborda a tarefa específica de identificar meta-relações, uma família de relações de ordem superior naturalmente construída como mantida entre outras relações que incluem relações temporais, comparativas e causais. Mais especificamente, visamos desenvolver fundamentos teóricos e soluções práticas para os desafios de (1) incorporar meta-relações em conceituações e esquemas de anotação para relações (de ordem inferior) e entidades nomeadas, (2) obter anotações para elas com carga cognitiva tolerável em anotadores, (3) criando modelos capazes de extrair meta-relações de forma confiável, e relacionado a isso (4) abordando o problema de dados limitados exacerbado pela introdução de meta-relações na tarefa de aprendizagem. Exploramos trabalhos recentes em extração de relações e discutimos nossos planos para conceitualizar formalmente meta-relações para o domínio de textos de saúde gerados pelo usuário e criar um novo conjunto de dados, esquema de anotação e modelos para extração de meta-relações.', 'zh': '夫取者,知之要务也,常定义为知文之实体者也。 本论提案及识元之具体任务,元者,高阶之族也,自为他说,及其日月,较之因果关系也。 更具体地说,吾等为下挑战开实解决方案:(1)纳元于(低阶)名实之概念化、注方之中,(2)为之注释,注者有可容之负荷,(3)创可凭取元,并与此相关(4)解因引元为限数。  习其事。 寻最新事,论新集,注方用户。', 'hi': 'संबंध निष्कर्षण ज्ञान निष्कर्षण में एक महत्वपूर्ण कार्य है, और आमतौर पर उन संबंधों की पहचान करने के कार्य के रूप में परिभाषित किया जाता है जो पाठ में संस्थाओं के बीच पकड़ते हैं। यह थीसिस प्रस्ताव मेटा-संबंधों की पहचान करने के विशिष्ट कार्य को संबोधित करता है, संबंधों का एक उच्च क्रम परिवार स्वाभाविक रूप से अन्य संबंधों के बीच धारण के रूप में माना जाता है जिसमें अस्थायी, तुलनात्मक और कारण संबंध शामिल हैं। अधिक विशेष रूप से, हम (1) (निचले क्रम) संबंधों और नामित संस्थाओं के लिए अवधारणाओं और एनोटेशन योजनाओं में मेटा-संबंधों को शामिल करने की चुनौतियों के लिए सैद्धांतिक आधार और व्यावहारिक समाधान विकसित करने का लक्ष्य रखते हैं, (2) एनोटेटर पर सहनीय संज्ञानात्मक भार के साथ उनके लिए एनोटेशन प्राप्त करना, (3) मेटा-संबंधों को मज़बूती से निकालने में सक्षम मॉडल बनाना, और उससे संबंधित (4) मेटा-संबंधों की शुरुआत से बढ़ी सीमित-डेटा समस्या को संबोधित करना  सीखने का काम। हम संबंध निष्कर्षण में हाल के कार्यों का पता लगाते हैं और उपयोगकर्ता-जनित स्वास्थ्य ग्रंथों के डोमेन के लिए मेटा-संबंधों को औपचारिक रूप से अवधारणा करने की हमारी योजनाओं पर चर्चा करते हैं, और मेटा-संबंध निष्कर्षण के लिए एक नया डेटासेट, एनोटेशन योजना और मॉडल बनाते हैं।', 'ja': '関係抽出は、ナレッジ抽出における重要なタスクであり、テキスト内のエンティティ間に保持されている関係を識別するタスクとして一般的に定義されています。 このテーゼ提案は、時間的、比較的、および因果関係を含む他の関係の間に保持されていると自然に解釈される関係の高次ファミリーであるメタ関係を特定する特定のタスクに対処する。 より具体的には、(1)メタリレーションを(下位の)関係および名前付きエンティティの概念化および注釈スキームに組み込むこと、(2)アノテーターに許容される認知負荷を持つそれらのためのアノテーションを取得すること、(3)メタリレーションを確実に抽出できるモデルを作成すること、およびそれに関連して(4)学習課題にメタリレーションを導入することによって悪化する限定的なデータ問題に対処すること、という課題に対する理論的基盤と実践的な解決策を開発することを目指している。 リレーショナル抽出に関する最近の研究を探求し、ユーザー生成ヘルステキストのドメインのメタリレーションを正式に概念化し、メタリレーション抽出のための新しいデータセット、注釈スキーム、モデルを作成する計画について話し合います。', 'ga': 'Príomhthasc in eastóscadh eolais is ea eastóscadh an chaidrimh, agus sainmhínítear é go coitianta mar thasc chun caidreamh a aithint a choinníonn aonáin i dtéacs. Tugann togra an tráchtais seo aghaidh ar an sainchúram maidir le meitichaidreamh a shainaithint, teaghlach d’ord níos airde de chaidrimh a fhorléirítear go nádúrtha mar chaidreamh idir caidreamh eile lena n-áirítear caidreamh ama, comparáideach agus cúiseach. Go sonrach, tá sé mar aidhm againn tacaí teoiriciúla agus réitigh phraiticiúla a fhorbairt do na dúshláin a bhaineann le (1) meitichaidreamh a ionchorprú i gcoincheapú agus i scéimeanna nótaí le haghaidh caidrimh (ord níos ísle) agus eintitis ainmnithe, (2) nótaí a fháil dóibh le hualach cognaíocha inghlactha. maidir le anótálaithe, (3) samhlacha a chruthú atá in ann meitichaidreamh a bhaint go hiontaofa, agus a bhaineann leis sin (4) aghaidh a thabhairt ar an bhfadhb maidir le sonraí teoranta atá níos measa de bharr meitichaidreamh a thabhairt isteach sa tasc foghlama. Déanaimid iniúchadh ar shaothair a rinneadh le déanaí maidir le heastóscadh agus pléimid ár bpleananna chun meitichaidreamh a choincheapadh go foirmiúil d’fhearann na dtéacsanna sláinte a ghintear leis an úsáideoir, agus cruthaímid tacar sonraí nua, scéim nótaí agus samhlacha le haghaidh eastóscadh meitiolaimh.', 'ru': 'Извлечение отношений является ключевой задачей в извлечении знаний и обычно определяется как задача выявления отношений, которые находятся между объектами в тексте. Данное диссертационное предложение решает конкретную задачу выявления мета-связей, семьи отношений более высокого порядка, естественно, интерпретируемых как поддержание между другими отношениями, которые включают в себя временные, сравнительные и причинно-следственные отношения. Более конкретно, мы стремимся разработать теоретические основы и практические решения для задач (1) включения мета-связей в концептуализации и схемы аннотаций для (нижнего порядка) отношений и именованных сущностей, (2) получения аннотаций для них с допустимой когнитивной нагрузкой на аннотаторы, (3) создания моделей, способных надежно извлекать мета-связи, и связанных с этим (4) решения проблемы ограниченных данных, усугубляемой введением мета-связей в обучающую задачу. Мы изучаем недавние работы по изучению взаимосвязей и обсуждаем наши планы формально концептуализировать мета-связи для области генерируемых пользователями текстов о здоровье и создать новый набор данных, схему аннотаций и модели для извлечения мета-связей.', 'hu': 'A kapcsolatkitermelés kulcsfontosságú feladat a tudás kitermelésében, és általában úgy határozzák meg, mint a szövegben lévő entitások közötti kapcsolatok azonosításának feladata. A szakdolgozat javaslata a metakapcsolatok azonosításának konkrét feladatát foglalja magában, amelyet természetesen más kapcsolatok közötti tartózkodásként értelmeznek, ideiglenes, összehasonlító és okozati kapcsolatokat magában foglaló viszonyok. Pontosabban elméleti alapok és gyakorlati megoldások kidolgozására törekszünk: (1) metakapcsolatok (alacsonyabb rendű) kapcsolatok és megnevezett entitások fogalmazásába és jegyzetelési sémáiba való beépítésére, (2) kommentátorok tolerálható kognitív terheléssel rendelkező jegyzetelésére, (3) metakapcsolatok megbízható kinyerésére alkalmas modellek létrehozására, és ehhez kapcsolódik (4) a metakapcsolatok tanulási feladatba történő bevezetése által súlyosbított korlátozott adatokkal kapcsolatos probléma kezelése. Feltárjuk a kapcsolatkivonással kapcsolatos legújabb munkákat, megvitatjuk a metakapcsolatok formális koncepcionálására irányuló terveinket a felhasználók által generált egészségügyi szövegek területén, valamint új adatkészletet, jegyzetelési sémát és modelleket hozunk létre a metakapcsolatok kivonásához.', 'el': 'Η εξαγωγή σχέσεων είναι μια βασική εργασία στην εξαγωγή γνώσης και ορίζεται συνήθως ως η εργασία του εντοπισμού σχέσεων που διατηρούνται μεταξύ οντοτήτων στο κείμενο. Η παρούσα πρόταση πραγματεύεται το συγκεκριμένο καθήκον του εντοπισμού μετα-σχέσεων, μιας ανώτερης τάξης οικογένειας σχέσεων που ερμηνεύεται φυσικά ως συγκράτηση μεταξύ άλλων σχέσεων που περιλαμβάνει χρονικές, συγκριτικές και αιτιώδεις σχέσεις. Πιο συγκεκριμένα, στοχεύουμε στην ανάπτυξη θεωρητικών θεμελιωδών και πρακτικών λύσεων για τις προκλήσεις της (1) ενσωμάτωσης μετα-σχέσεων σε εννοιολογήσεις και συστήματα σχολιασμού για (κατώτερης τάξης) σχέσεις και ονομαστικές οντότητες, (2) απόκτησης σχολίων για αυτές με ανεκτό γνωστικό φορτίο στους σχολιαστές, (3) δημιουργίας μοντέλων ικανών να εξάγουν αξιόπιστα μετα-σχέσεις, και σχετίζεται με αυτό (4) την αντιμετώπιση του προβλήματος περιορισμένων δεδομένων που επιδεινώνεται από την εισαγωγή μετα-σχέσεων στο μαθησιακό έργο. Εξετάζουμε πρόσφατα έργα σχετικά με την εξαγωγή σχέσεων και συζητάμε τα σχέδιά μας για την τυπική εννοιολογία των μετα-σχέσεων για τον τομέα των κειμένων υγείας που δημιουργούνται από τους χρήστες, καθώς και για τη δημιουργία ενός νέου συνόλου δεδομένων, συστήματος σχολιασμού και μοντέλων για την εξαγωγή μετα-σχέσεων.', 'ka': 'Relationship extraction is a key task in knowledge extraction, and is commonly defined as the task of identifying relations that hold between entities in text. ეს ცესის პროგრამების განსაკუთრებული დავალება მეტა-შესახებების განსაკუთრებისთვის, უფრო მეტი შესახებების ოჯახი, რომელიც ნართვის განსაკუთრებულია სხვა შესახებ შორის, რომელიც სამ უფრო განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ მინდომით თეორეტიკური პროფიკალური გარეშე და პროფიკალური გარეშე (1) მინდომებისთვის მეტა-პროფიკალური გარეშე კონცეტულაციაში და ანტოციაციის ქემებში (ცოტა პროფიკალური) პროფიკალური და მინდომებისთვის (ცოტა პროფიკალური) ანტო და ამ (4) პრობლემების შესახებ, რომელიც მეტა-პრობლემების შესახებ სწავლობის რაოდენობაში გააკეთებულია. ჩვენ ახალი სამუშაო მუშაოების გამოყენებაში გამოყენება და ჩვენი პლანეების განსხვავება, რომლებიც მომხმარებელი გამოყენებული ჯანმრთელი ტექსტის დიომინზე მეტა-შესახებ კონტექსტულაციის კონტექ', 'kk': 'Қатысушылық тарқату - білім тарқатуының кілт тапсырмасы, және әдетте мәтіндегі құрылғылар арасындағы қатынастарды анықтау тапсырмасы ретінде анықталады. Бұл тезиясы мета-қатынасын анықтау керек тапсырманы, қатынастардың көбірек реті басқа қатынастардың арасындағы уақытша, салыстырмалы және себепті қатынастардың арасындағы қатынастарды байланыстыру үшін,  Ең жақсы, біз теоретикалық түсініктерді және (1) мәселелердің мета-қатынастарын концептуализациялау және (төменгі реттік) қатынастар және аталған нысандар сұлбаларына (төменгі реттік) қатынастар және аталған нысандар сұлбаларына ендіру үшін мақсатымыз, (2) олардың аңдатушыларына тәуелді ко Мета-қатынастарын оқыту тапсырмасына енгізілген шектелген деректер мәселесін шектелген (4) қатынасы. Біз соңғы жұмыстарды тарқату жұмыстарында зерттеп, пайдаланушылардың құрылған саулық мәтіндер доменінің мета-қатынасын официалдық түрде концептуализациялау жұмыстарымен талқылап, жаңа деректер жиыны, жаңа жазбалар сұ', 'it': "L'estrazione delle relazioni è un compito chiave nell'estrazione della conoscenza, ed è comunemente definito come il compito di identificare le relazioni tra entità nel testo. La presente proposta di tesi affronta il compito specifico di identificare le metarelazioni, una famiglia di relazioni di ordine superiore naturalmente interpretata come tenuta tra altre relazioni che include relazioni temporali, comparative e causali. Più specificamente, miriamo a sviluppare basi teoriche e soluzioni pratiche per le sfide di (1) incorporare meta-relazioni in concettualizzazioni e schemi di annotazione per relazioni (di ordine inferiore) e entità nominate, (2) ottenere annotazioni per esse con carico cognitivo tollerabile sugli annotatori, (3) creare modelli in grado di estrarre in modo affidabile meta-relazioni, (4) affrontare il problema dei dati limitati aggravato dall'introduzione di metarelazioni nel compito di apprendimento. Esploriamo lavori recenti sull'estrazione delle relazioni e discutiamo i nostri piani di concettualizzazione formale delle metarelazioni per il dominio dei testi sanitari generati dagli utenti, e creiamo un nuovo dataset, uno schema di annotazione e modelli per l'estrazione delle metarelazioni.", 'lt': 'Santykių išgavimas yra pagrindinė žinių išgavimo užduotis ir paprastai apibrėžiama kaip užduotis nustatyti subjektų tarpusavio santykius tekste. Šiame pasiūlyme nagrinėjama konkreti užduotis nustatyti metasantykius, aukštesnės tvarkos santykių šeimą, suprantamą kaip kitų santykių, įskaitant laikinus, lyginamuosius ir priežastinius santykius, palaikymą. Konkrečiau, siekiame sukurti teorinius pagrindus ir praktinius sprendimus iššūkiams, susijusiems su (1) metasantykių įtraukimu į (žemesnės tvarkos) santykių ir pavadintų subjektų koncepcijų ir anotacijų sistemas, (2) jiems skirtų anotacijų su toleruojama pažintine našta anotatoriams, (3) modelių kūrimu, galinčių patikimai išgauti metasantykius, 4) sprendžiant ribotų duomenų problem ą, dar labiau pablogėjusią metasantykių įtraukimu į mokymosi užduotį. Mes tiriame neseniai atliktus darbus, susijusius su gavyba, ir aptariame savo planus oficialiai konceptualizuoti naudotojų sukurtų sveikatos tekstų srities metasantykius ir sukurti naują duomenų rinkinį, anotacijų schemą ir metasantykių gavimo modelius.', 'ms': 'Ekstrasi hubungan adalah tugas utama dalam ekstraksi pengetahuan, dan biasanya ditakrif sebagai tugas mengenalpasti hubungan yang ada diantara entiti dalam teks. cadangan tesis ini menghadapi tugas khusus untuk mengenalpasti hubungan meta, keluarga tertib yang lebih tinggi hubungan secara alami dianggap hubungan lain yang termasuk hubungan sementara, perbandingan, dan penyebab. More specifically, we aim to develop theoretical underpinnings and practical solutions for the challenges of (1) incorporating meta-relations into conceptualisations and annotation schemes for (lower-order) relations and named entities, (2) obtaining annotations for them with tolerable cognitive load on annotators, (3) creating models capable of reliably extracting meta-relations,  and related to that (4) addressing the limited-data problem exacerbated by the introduction of meta-relations into the learning task.  Kami mengeksplorasi kerja-kerja baru-baru ini mengenai ekstraksi hubungan dan membincangkan rancangan kami untuk secara rasmi konseptualisasi hubungan meta untuk domain teks kesehatan yang dijana oleh pengguna, dan mencipta set data baru, skema anotasi dan model untuk ekstraksi hubungan meta.', 'mk': 'Извлекувањето на односите е клучна задача во извлекувањето на знаењето и е обично дефинирано како задача за идентификување на односите кои се содржат меѓу ентитетите во текстот. Овој предлог за теза се обраќа на специфичната задача за идентификување на мета-односите, семејство со повисоки редови на односи природно претпоставено како држење меѓу другите односи кои вклучуваат температурни, споредливи и причинни односи. Поконкретно, ние имаме за цел да развиеме теоретски основи и практични решенија за предизвиците од (1) вклучувањето на мета-односите во концептуализациите и шемите на анотација за (понискиот ред) односите и именуваните ентитети, (2) добивање анотации за нив со толерабилно когнитивно товарување на анотаторите, (3) создавање модели способни за доверливо извле ) и поврзани со тоа (4) решавање на проблемот со ограничени податоци што се вложува со воведувањето на мета-односите во задачата за учење. Истражуваме неодамнешни дела во врска со екстракцијата и разговараме за нашите планови за официјално концептуализирање на мета-односите за доменот на здравствените тексти генерирани од корисникот, и создавање на нов набор на податоци, шема на анотации и модели за екстрак', 'ml': 'പരിജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെ പുറത്തുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ജോലിയാണ് ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d എന്ന പ്രധാനപ് ഈ പരിപാടിയുടെ പ്രൊജക്റ്റ് മെറ്റാ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രത്യേക ജോലിയെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. മറ്റു ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്കിടയി കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മുടെ ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു (1) മേറ്റ-ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d കണക്ടിലേക്ക് ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്ന സങ്കീര്\u200dണങ്ങളിലേക്കും പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന വിലാസങ്ങളിലേക്കും ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിലേക്കും, നിര്\u200dണ്ണയി പഠിക്കുന്ന ജോലിയിലേക്ക് മെറ്റ-ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d അതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് പരിധിയുള്ള ഡാറ്റാ പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d  നമ്മള്\u200d അടുത്തുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പരിപാടികള്\u200d മെറ്റാ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നതും, ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെട്ട ആശ്വാസപാഠങ്ങളുട', 'mt': 'L-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet hija kompitu ewlieni fl-estrazzjoni tal-għarfien, u hija definita b’mod komuni bħala l-kompitu li jiġu identifikati r-relazzjonijiet li għandhom bejn entitajiet fit-test. Din il-proposta ta’ thesis tindirizza l-kompitu speċifiku tal-identifikazzjoni ta’ meta-relazzjonijiet, familja ta’ ordni ogħla ta’ relazzjonijiet mifhuma b’mod naturali bħala żamma bejn relazzjonijiet oħra li jinkludu relazzjonijiet temporali, komparattivi, u kawżali. B’mod aktar speċifiku, għandna l-għan li niżviluppaw bażi teoretika u soluzzjonijiet prattiċi għall-isfidi ta’ (1) l-inkorporazzjoni ta’ meta-relazzjonijiet fil-kunċettwalizzazzjonijiet u skemi ta’ annotazzjoni għal relazzjonijiet (ta’ ordni aktar baxxa) u entitajiet imsemmija, (2) il-kisba ta’ annotazzjonijiet għalihom b’tagħbija konjittiva tollerabbli fuq l-annotaturi, (3) il-ħolqien ta’ mudelli li kapaċi jestraxxu b’mod affidabbli l ) u relatati ma’ dak (4) li jindirizza l-problema ta’ dejta limitata aggravata bl-introduzzjoni ta’ meta-relazzjonijiet fil-kompitu ta’ tagħlim. Aħna nesploraw xogħlijiet reċenti fir-rigward tal-estrazzjoni u niddiskutu l-pjanijiet tagħna biex formalment nikkunċettwalizzaw il-metarelazzjonijiet għall-qasam tat-testi tas-saħħa ġġenerati mill-utent, u noħolqu sett ġdid ta’ dejta, skema ta’ annotazzjoni u mudelli għall-estrazzjoni tal-metarelazzjonijiet.', 'pl': 'Ekstrakcja relacji jest kluczowym zadaniem w ekstrakcji wiedzy i jest powszechnie definiowana jako zadanie identyfikowania relacji, które utrzymują się między podmiotami w tekście. Niniejsza propozycja pracy dotyczy specyficznego zadania identyfikacji metarelacji, rodziny relacji wyższego rzędu naturalnie interpretowanej jako utrzymywania pomiędzy innymi relacjami, która obejmuje relacje czasowe, porównawcze i przyczynowe. W szczególności naszym celem jest opracowanie podstaw teoretycznych i praktycznych rozwiązań dla wyzwań związanych z (1) włączeniem metarelacji do konceptualizacji i schematów adnotacji dla relacji (niższego rzędu) i nazwanych podmiotów, (2) uzyskiwaniem dla nich adnotacji o tolerowanym obciążeniu poznawczym na adnotatory, (3) tworzenie modeli zdolnych do rzetelnego wydobycia metarelacji, i związane z tym (4) rozwiązanie problemu ograniczonej ilości danych pogłębionego wprowadzeniem metarelacji do zadania uczenia się. Badamy najnowsze prace w ekstrakcji relacji i omawiamy nasze plany formalnego konceptualizowania metarelacji dla domeny tekstów zdrowia generowanych przez użytkowników oraz stworzenia nowego zbioru danych, schematu adnotacji i modeli ekstrakcji metarelacji.', 'ro': 'Extragerea relațiilor este o sarcină cheie în extragerea cunoștințelor și este definită în mod obișnuit ca sarcina de a identifica relațiile care țin între entități în text. Această propunere de teză abordează sarcina specifică de identificare a meta-relațiilor, o familie de relații de ordine superioară interpretată în mod natural ca ținând între alte relații care includ relații temporale, comparative și cauzale. Mai exact, ne propunem să dezvoltăm baze teoretice și soluții practice pentru provocările (1) încorporării meta-relațiilor în conceptualizări și scheme de adnotare pentru relațiile (de ordin inferior) și entitățile denumite, (2) obținerea de adnotări pentru acestea cu sarcină cognitivă tolerabilă pe adnotatori, (3) crearea de modele capabile să extragă în mod fiabil meta-relații, (4) abordarea problemei datelor limitate exacerbate de introducerea meta-relațiilor în sarcina de învățare. Explorăm lucrări recente în domeniul extracției relațiilor și discutăm planurile noastre de conceptualizare formală a meta-relațiilor pentru domeniul textelor de sănătate generate de utilizatori și creăm un nou set de date, schemă de adnotare și modele pentru extracția meta-relații.', 'mn': 'Хариулт татах нь мэдлэгтэй гаргах хамгийн чухал ажил юм. Энэ нь ихэвчлэн текст биетийн хоорондын харилцааны тодорхойлолт гэж тодорхойлдог. Энэ сэдвийн санал нь мета-харилцааны тодорхойлолт, харилцааны харилцааны гэр бүл байгалийн харилцааны илүү өндөр дарааллаар байгуулагдсан өөр харилцааны хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын холбоотой байдлыг тодорхой Илүү тодорхой нь, бид (1) сорилтуудын теоретикийн үндсэн, практикийн шийдэлүүдийг (бага дараагийн) харилцаа болон нэрлэгдсэн байгууллагуудын төлөө (бага дараагийн) харилцаа болон нэрлэгдсэн байгууллагуудын төлөө (2) мета-харилцаа бүрдүүлэх боломжтой загваруудын төлөө (1) шийдвэрлэх, 2) тэдний төлөө тэдний зори Мөн энэ (4) нь суралцах үйл ажилд мета-харилцааны ачааллаар нэмэгдсэн хязгаарлагдсан өгөгдлийн асуудлыг тайлбарлаж байна. Бид сүүлийн үеийн ажиллагааг татаж, хэрэглэгчийн эрүүл мэндийн текстүүдийн талаар мета-харилцааны официально ойлгох төлөвлөгөөний тухай судалж, мета-харилцааны татаж авах шинэ өгөгдлийн сангууд, нотолгоо схемийг, загварыг бүтээх.', 'no': 'Relationship extraction is a key task in knowledge extraction, and is commonly defined as the task of identifying relations that hold between entities in text. Denne forslag addresserer den spesifikke oppgåva for identifisering av metarelasjonar, ein høgare rekkefølgje av relasjonar som naturleg er konstruert som holding mellom andre relasjonar som inneheld temporale, sammenlignbare og grunnlag. Dette er meir spesifikt at me mål å utvikle teoretiske undergrunnleggingar og praktiske løysingar for utfordringane av (1) som inkluderer metarelasjonar i konseptualiseringsskema og annotasjonsskema for (mindre rekkjefølgje) relasjonar og namnet einingar, (2) å få annotasjonar for dei med tolerable kognitiv lasting på annotatorar, (3) å laga modeller som kan betre utpakke metarelasjonar, og relatert til det (4) som adresserer problemet med begrensningsdata som er exasert ved innføring av metarelasjonar i læringsoppgåva. Vi undersøker nyleg arbeid i forhold til utpakking og diskuterer planene våre for å formelt konseptualisera metaforhold for domenet av helsetekstar som er generert med brukar, og laga eit ny dataset, notasjonsskjema og modell for utpakking av metaforhold.', 'sr': 'Ekstrakcija odnosa je ključni zadatak u izvlačenju znanja, i obično se definira kao zadatak identifikacije odnosa koje imaju između entitata u tekstu. Ovaj prijedlog za tezu se bavi specifičnim zadatkom identifikacije meta-odnosa, većoj porodici odnosa koje prirodno smatra kao držanje između drugih odnosa koji uključuju temporalne, usporedbene i uzročne odnose. Posebnije, ciljamo da razvijemo teorijske temelje i praktične rješenja za izazove (1) uključujući metaodnose u konceptualizacije i annotacijske shme za (niže redove) odnose i imenovane entitate, (2) dobijemo annotacije za njih sa tolerantnim kognitivnim teretom na annotatore, (3) stvaranjem modela sposobnih za pouzdano izvlačenje metaodnosa, i povezano s tim (4) u rješavanju problema sa ograničenim podacima koje je pogoršavalo uvođenjem metaodnosa u zadatak učenja. Istražujemo nedavne radove u odnosu na ekstrakciju odnosa i razgovaramo o našim planovima o formalnom konceptualizaciji metaodnosa za domenu zdravstvenih tekstova koji su stvorili korisnike, i stvaramo novu setu podataka, programu annotacije i modele za ekstrakciju metaodnosa.', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ නිර්මාණය තමයි දැනගැනීම් නිර්මාණයේ යතුරු වැඩක්, ඒ වගේම සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ සම්බන මේ සැලසුම් ප්\u200dරතිපත්තේ මෙටා-සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ වැඩක් ලැබෙනවා මෙටා-සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ විශේෂ වැඩක්, තරම් සම්බන්ධ විශ තව විශේෂයෙන්, අපි ඉලක්ෂා කරනවා තේරුණාත්මක අධ්\u200dයානය සහ ප්\u200dරකාරිය විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා අභ්\u200dයානය සඳහා මෙටා සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් තේරුම් සහ අධ්\u200dයානය සඳහා අධ්\u200dයානය සඳහා අධ්\u200dයානය සඳහා අධ්\u200dයා ඒ (4) සම්බන්ධයෙන් මෙටා-සම්බන්ධ වැඩේ ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා. අපි අලුත් වැඩක් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට, අපේ සැලැස්ම සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට මෙටා සම්බන්ධ විදියට පරීක්ෂා කරනවා ප්\u200dරයෝ', 'so': 'Ka soo saarista xiriirka waa shaqo muhiim ah oo ku saabsan soo baxashada aqoonta, waxaana lagu qoraa sida caadiga ah oo loo yaqaan xiriirka ku xiriira macluumaadka u dhexeeya. Qoraalkan tijaabada ah wuxuu ku qoran yahay shaqo gaar ah oo ku saabsan aqoonsashada xiriirka meta-xiriirka, qoyska kala duduwan ee si dabiiqada ah u qoran xiriirka kale, kuwaas oo ku jira waqti, isbarbardhig iyo xiriirka sababta ah. Si gaar ah, waxaan u baahan nahay inaannu horumarinno qalabka fikrada iyo waxyaabaha caadiga ah ee ku qoraya iskaasha meta-xiriirka iyo qorshaha dhibaatada la xiriira (muraajiyada hoose) iyo waxyaabaha la magacaabay, (2) si ay u helaan warqado ay u fududaato oo ay u sameyn karto dhibaatooyin si aamin ah u soo saari karto xiriirka meta-xiriirka, iyo ku saabsan taas (4) in la macaamiloodo dhibaatada taarifka xadiiqada ah ee la soo saaro xiriirka meta-xiriirka waxbarashada. Waxaynu baaraynaa shaqaalaha la xiriira soo saarashada iyo qorshaha aan si rasmi ah u qorsheyno inay u fekeraan xiriirka meta-xiriirka ee gudaha xarumaha caafimaadka ee isticmaalayaasha, waxaana sameynaynaa qorshaha cusub ee macluumaadka, qorshaha waraaqo iyo qaababka la soo saaro meta-xiriirka.', 'sv': 'Relationsutvinning är en viktig uppgift i kunskapsutvinning och definieras vanligen som uppgiften att identifiera relationer som håller mellan entiteter i text. Detta examensförslag behandlar den specifika uppgiften att identifiera metarelationer, en högre klass familj av relationer naturligt tolkade som att hålla mellan andra relationer som inkluderar tidsmässiga, jämförande och orsakssamband. Mer specifikt syftar vi till att utveckla teoretiska grunder och praktiska lösningar för utmaningarna att (1) införliva metarelationer i konceptualiseringar och annotationsscheman för (lägre ordning) relationer och namngivna entiteter, (2) erhålla anteckningar för dem med tolerabel kognitiv belastning på kommentatorer, (3) skapa modeller som på ett tillförlitligt sätt kan extrahera metarelationer, och relaterade till detta (4) att ta itu med problemet med begränsade data som förvärrats av införandet av metarelationer i inlärningsuppgiften. Vi utforskar senaste arbeten inom relationsextraktion och diskuterar våra planer på att formellt konceptualisera metarelationer för domänen användargenererade hälsotexter, och skapar ett nytt dataset, kommentarschema och modeller för metarelationsextraktion.', 'ta': 'தொடர்பு பிரிப்பு என்பது அறிவு பெறுதலில் முக்கிய பணி இந்த தேர்வு பரிந்துரையின் முன்னிருப்பு மெடா தொடர்புகளை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் குறிப்பிட்ட பணியை குறிப்பிடுகிறது, அதிக வரிசையான உறவின் குடும் மேலும் குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் (1) கருத்து தொடர்புகளை சேர்க்க (குறைந்த வரிசையில்) மற்றும் பெயர்க்கப்பட்ட பொருள்களுக்கும் கருத்து மற்றும் அறிவிப்பு திட்டங்களுக்கும் சவால்களுக்கான தொடர்புகளை உருவாக்க வேண்டும் மேலும் (4) கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் பணியில் மெடா தொடர்புகளை முன்னேற்றியதால் வரையறை தகவல் பிரச்சினையை குறிப்பிடும். நாங்கள் சமீபத்தில் வேலைகளை பிரித்து நம் திட்டங்களை வடிவமைக்க முறைமையாக கண்டறிந்து பயனர் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட ஆரோக்க உருவங்களின் களத்திற்கான மெடா தொடர்புகளை பற்றி வ', 'ur': 'Relative extraction is a key task in knowledge extraction, and is commonly defined as the task of identifying relations that hold entities in text. یہ پیشنهاد مٹا-رابطہ شناسایی کے مطابق مشخص کوشش کے ذریعے مطابق کرتا ہے، ایک اچھی طرح کی رشتہ داری کے خاندان کو طبیعی طور پر بنایا گیا ہے اور دوسری رابطہ داری کے درمیان تھام کرتا ہے جس میں temporal, comparative اور causal relations شا اور اس سے زیادہ مشخص ہے کہ ہم تئوریٹی بنیادیں اور практическиے حل کرنے کا ارادہ کریں (1) کی چالوں کے لئے مٹا-رابطہ مضبوطی اور مضبوطی طریقوں میں شامل کریں (نیچے طریقے) رابطہ اور نام دار شریکوں کے لئے اور (2) ان کے لئے مضبوطی مضبوطی لوڈ کے ساتھ مضبوطی حاصل کریں اور (3) مٹا-رابطہ کے ساتھ مضبوطی سے نک اور اس (4) کے معاملہ میں جو مٹا-رابطہ کی معلومات کے ذریعہ مزید اضافہ کیا گیا ہے، اس کے بارے میں (4) مقررہ ڈیٹا مسئلہ کی حفاظت کرتا ہے۔ ہم اٹھانے کے ارتباط میں اچھے کاموں کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں اور اپنے تدبیروں کی بحث کرتے ہیں کہ استعمال کے پیدا کئے ہوئے سلامتی ٹیکسٹوں کے ڈمین کے مطابق مٹا-رابطہ کے مطابق مٹا-رابطہ کے مطابق بحث کریں اور مٹا-رابطہ اٹھانے کے لئے نئی', 'uz': "Name Bu nazorat rivojlanishi meta-munosabatlarni aniqlash uchun foydalanuvchi vazifani anglatadi. Boshqa aloqalarning orasidagi aloqalarni o'zgartirish mumkin, vaqt, tenglashtirish va sababchi aloqalarni o'zgartirish mumkin. Ko'pchilik, biz meta-munosabatlarini tasavvur qilish va taʼminot qoliplarini boshqarish imkoniyatlariga o'rganish uchun teoretikal tuzuvchilarini va 实ktikal usullarni o'rganamiz va o'zgarishni tasavvur qilishni istaysizmi, (2) ularga taʼminlovchilar bilan ishlab chiqarish imkoniyatlariga ega bo'ladi, (3) meta-xiraliklarini ishlata oladigan modellar yaratish mumkin, va bu (4) ta'lim vazifasini o'rganish uchun meta-relatetlarni o'rganish muvaffaqiyatlarni boshqarish uchun chegara maʼlumot muammolarini boshqarish mumkin. We explore recent works in relation extraction and discuss our plans to formally conceptualise meta-relations for the domain of user-generated health texts, and create a new dataset, annotation scheme and models for meta-relation extraction.", 'vi': 'Việc khai thác tương quan là một nhiệm vụ quan trọng trong việc khai thác kiến thức, và thường được gọi là nhiệm vụ xác định mối quan hệ giữa các thực thể trong văn bản. Bài luận văn đề xuất này nhằm vào nhiệm vụ đặc biệt của việc xác định các meta-relationship, a higher order family of relationsonship naturally được phân tích là hold between other relationship which includes Tạm, computer, and hệ hệ thống nguyên nhân. Cụ thể hơn, chúng tôi hướng tới phát triển khả năng căn cứ lý thuyết và giải pháp thực tế cho các thử thách của(1) việc nhập các meta-Ann vào quy trình định và ghi chú cho các mối quan hệ (hạ đẳng) và các thực thể tên(2) Lấy được chú thích cho họ với khả năng chịu chịu sức chịu nhận thức trên các nhà biên tập (3) tạo các mô hình có khả năng khai thác các meta-hệ, và liên quan tới (4) giải quyết vấn đề giới hạn dữ liệu trầm trọng hơn khi đưa các meta-hệ vào nhiệm vụ học. Chúng tôi khám phá các tác phẩm gần đây trong việc trích xuất liên quan và thảo luận về kế hoạch về khái niệm meta-relationship cho miền vực của văn bản sức khỏe người dùng, và tạo ra một tập tin mới, một chương trình ghi chú và mô hình về chiết xuất các meta-relationship.', 'hr': 'Ekstrakcija odnosa je ključni zadatak u izvlačenju znanja i obično se definira kao zadatak identifikacije odnosa koje imaju između entitata u tekstu. U ovom prijedlogu o tezi se uključuje specifičan zadatak identifikacije metaodnosa, višeg reda obitelji odnosa koje se prirodno smatra kao držanje između drugih odnosa koji uključuju temporalne, usporedbene i uzročne odnose. Posebnije, ciljamo razviti teorijske temelje i praktične rješenja za izazove (1) uključujući metaodnose u konceptualizacije i annotacijske shme za odnose i imenovane subjekte (niže redove), dobiti annotacije za njih s tolerantnim kognitivnim teretom na annotatore, (3) stvaranje modela sposobnih pouzdano izvlačenja metaodnosa, i povezano s tim (4) rješavanjem problema s ograničenim podacima povećanog uvođenjem metaodnosa u zadatak učenja. Istražujemo nedavne radove u odnosu na ekstrakciju i razgovaramo o našim planovima o formalnom konceptualizaciji metaodnosa za domenu zdravstvenih tekstova proizvedenih korisnika i stvaranju novog seta podataka, programa annotacije i modela ekstrakcije metaodnosa.', 'bg': 'Извличането на отношенията е ключова задача в извличането на знания и обикновено се определя като задачата за идентифициране на отношенията, които се държат между субектите в текста. Настоящото предложение за дисертация разглежда специфичната задача за идентифициране на мета-отношения, семейство от по-висок ред от отношения, естествено тълкувано като задържане между други отношения, което включва времеви, сравнителни и причинно-следствени отношения. По-конкретно, ние се стремим да разработим теоретични основи и практически решения за предизвикателствата на (1) включване на мета-връзки в концептуализации и анотационни схеми за (по-нисък ред) отношения и имена, (2) получаване на анотации за тях с допустимо когнитивно натоварване върху анотатори, (3) създаване на модели, способни надеждно да извличат мета-връзки, и във връзка с това (4) решаване на проблема с ограничените данни, изострян от въвеждането на мета-връзки в учебната задача. Проучваме последните работи в областта на извличането на връзки и обсъждаме плановете си за официално концептуализиране на мета-релации за областта на генерираните от потребителите здравни текстове, както и създаване на нов набор от данни, схема за анотация и модели за извличане на мета-релации.', 'da': 'Relationsudtrækning er en vigtig opgave i videnudtrækning, og er almindeligt defineret som opgaven med at identificere relationer, der holder mellem enheder i tekst. Dette afhandlingsforslag omhandler den specifikke opgave at identificere meta-relationer, en højere ordensfamilie af relationer naturligt fortolket som holdning mellem andre relationer, der omfatter tidsmæssige, komparative og kausale relationer. Mere specifikt tilstræber vi at udvikle teoretiske understøttelser og praktiske løsninger på udfordringerne ved (1) at indarbejde metarelationer i konceptualiseringer og annotationsordninger for (lavere orden) relationer og navngivne entiteter, (2) at få noteringer til dem med tolerabel kognitiv belastning på annotatorer, (3) at skabe modeller, der er i stand til pålideligt at udtrække metarelationer, og relateret til dette (4) løsning af problemet med begrænsede data, der forværres af indførelsen af meta-relationer i læringsopgaven. Vi undersøger nylige værker i relation ekstraktion og diskuterer vores planer om formelt at konceptualisere meta-relationer for domænet brugergenererede sundhedstekster, og skaber et nyt datasæt, annotationsskema og modeller til meta-relation ekstraktion.', 'nl': "Relatie extractie is een belangrijke taak in kennisextractie, en wordt algemeen gedefinieerd als de taak van het identificeren van relaties tussen entiteiten in tekst. Dit proefschrift voorstel behandelt de specifieke taak van het identificeren van meta-relaties, een hogere orde familie van relaties die natuurlijk wordt geïnterpreteerd als holding tussen andere relaties die temporele, vergelijkende en causale relaties omvat. Meer specifiek willen we theoretische onderbouwingen en praktische oplossingen ontwikkelen voor de uitdagingen van (1) het opnemen van meta-relaties in conceptualisaties en annotatieschema's voor (lagere) relaties en benoemde entiteiten, (2) het verkrijgen van annotaties voor hen met een aanvaardbare cognitieve belasting op annotatoren, (3) het creëren van modellen die meta-relaties betrouwbaar kunnen extraheren, en daarmee verband houdend (4) de aanpak van het probleem van beperkte gegevens dat wordt verergerd door de invoering van meta-relaties in de leertaak. We onderzoeken recente werken op het gebied van relatieontwikkeling en bespreken onze plannen om meta-relaties formeel te conceptualiseren voor het domein van user-generated health teksten, en creëren een nieuwe dataset, annotatieschema en modellen voor meta-relatieontwikkeling.", 'ko': '관계 추출은 지식 추출의 관건적인 임무로 보통 텍스트의 실체 간의 관계를 식별하는 것으로 정의된다.이 논문의 제의는 원관계를 확정하는 구체적인 임무를 해결했다. 원관계는 고급 관계족으로 자연히 다른 관계에서 관계를 유지하는 것으로 해석된다. 이는 시간관계, 비교관계와 인과관계를 포함한다.더욱 구체적으로 말하면 우리는 이론적 기초와 실제 해결 방안을 개발하여 다음과 같은 도전에 대응하고자 한다. (1) 원관계를 (저급) 관계와 명명 실체의 개념화와 주석 방안에 포함시킨다. (2) 주석자가 감당할 수 있는 인지적 부하로 주석을 얻는다. (3) 원 관계를 믿을 수 있는 모델을 만들고이와 관련된 것은 (4) 유한한 데이터 문제를 해결하는데 이런 문제는 학습 임무에 원 관계를 도입하여 심해진다.우리는 최근 관계 추출에 대한 연구를 하고 사용자를 위한 건강한 텍스트 영역에서 원 관계를 정식으로 정의하고 새로운 데이터 집합, 주석 방안과 원 관계 추출 모델을 만드는 계획을 토론했다.', 'id': 'Ekstraksi hubungan adalah tugas kunci dalam ekstraksi pengetahuan, dan biasanya didefinisikan sebagai tugas untuk mengidentifikasi hubungan yang ada antara entitas dalam teks. Proposisi tesis ini mengatasi tugas spesifik untuk mengidentifikasi meta-hubungan, keluarga tertib tinggi hubungan secara alami dianggap memegang antara hubungan lain yang termasuk hubungan temporal, comparatif, dan penyebab. Lebih spesifik, kami bertujuan untuk mengembangkan dasar teori dan solusi praktis untuk tantangan (1) memasukkan hubungan meta ke dalam konseptualisasi dan skema anotasi untuk hubungan (rendah-rendah) dan entitas bernama, (2) mendapatkan anotasi untuk mereka dengan beban kognitif tolerabel pada annotator, (3) menciptakan model yang mampu mengekstraksi meta-hubungan dengan yakin,  and related to that (4) addressing the limited-data problem exacerbated by the introduction of meta-relations into the learning task.  Kami mengeksplorasi pekerjaan baru-baru ini dalam hubungan ekstraksi dan mendiskusikan rencana kami untuk secara resmi konseptualisasi meta-hubungan untuk domain teks kesehatan yang dibuat oleh pengguna, dan menciptakan set data baru, skema anotasi dan model untuk ekstraksi meta-hubungan.', 'sw': 'Uchaguzi wa uhusiano ni kazi muhimu katika uteuzi wa maarifa, na kwa kawaida inaelezwa kama jukumu la kutambua mahusiano yanayohusiana na vifaa vya maandishi. Pendekezo hili linahusu jukumu maalum la kutambua mahusiano ya watu, familia ya juu ya mahusiano ya asili iliyokuwa imezuiwa kama kushirikiana kati ya mahusiano mengine yanayojumuisha muda wa muda, ukilinganisha na mahusiano yanayosababisha. Zaidi zaidi, tunakusudia kuendeleza ufumbuzi wa nadharia na ufumbuzi wa utaratibu wa changamoto za (1) kuingiza mahusiano ya meta katika mawazo na mipango ya uchochezi kwa ajili ya mahusiano ya (amri ya chini) na vinavyoitwa, (2) kupata matangazo kwa ajili yao na mzigo wa kitambulisho rahisi kwa wataalamu, (3) kutengeneza mifano yenye uwezo wa kutengeneza mahusiano ya meta, na kuhusiana na hilo (4) kuhusiana na tatizo lenye taarifa zilizozidi kuongezeka kwa kuanzisha mahusiano ya meta katika kazi ya kujifunza. Tunafanya kazi za hivi karibuni kuhusiana na utekelezaji na kujadili mipango yetu ya kufikiri rasmi ya mahusiano ya meta kwa ajili ya maeneo ya ujumbe wa afya unaotengenezwa na watumiaji, na kutengeneza seti mpya ya taarifa, mpango wa uchunguzi na mifano kwa ajili ya utoaji wa mahusiano yanayohusiana na watu.', 'de': 'Beziehungsextraktion ist eine Schlüsselaufgabe in der Wissensextraktion und wird allgemein als die Aufgabe definiert, Beziehungen zu identifizieren, die zwischen Entitäten im Text bestehen. Dieser Dissertationsvorschlag befasst sich mit der spezifischen Aufgabe, Meta-Relationen zu identifizieren, einer Familie höherer Ordnung, die natürlich als Halten zwischen anderen Relationen interpretiert wird, die zeitliche, komparative und kausale Beziehungen einschließt. Insbesondere zielen wir darauf ab, theoretische Grundlagen und praktische Lösungen für die Herausforderungen zu entwickeln (1) Meta-Relationen in Konzeptualisierungen und Annotationsschemata für (niedrigere) Beziehungen und benannte Entitäten zu integrieren, (2) Annotationen für sie mit tolerierbarer kognitiver Belastung für Annotatoren zu erhalten, (3) Modelle zu erstellen, die Meta-Relationen zuverlässig extrahieren können, und damit verbunden (4) die Lösung des Problems begrenzter Daten, das durch die Einführung von Meta-Relationen in die Lernaufgabe verschärft wird. Wir untersuchen aktuelle Arbeiten zur Beziehungsextraktion und diskutieren unsere Pläne, Meta-Relationen für die Domäne nutzergenerierter Gesundheitstexte formal zu konzipieren, und erstellen einen neuen Datensatz, Annotationsschema und Modelle für die Meta-Beziehungsextraktion.', 'fa': 'اخراج رابطه یک کار کلید در اخراج علم است، و معمولاً به عنوان وظیفه شناسایی رابطه\u200cهایی که بین واحدها در متن دارند تعریف می\u200cشود. این پیشنهاد تئیس به کار خاصی از شناسایی رابطه\u200cهای متا، خانواده\u200cی سفارشی بالاتر از رابطه\u200cهای طبیعی که در میان رابطه\u200cهای دیگری که شامل رابطه\u200cهای موقتی، مقایسه\u200cکننده و باعث\u200cکننده\u200cای هستند وصیت می\u200c مخصوصاً ما هدف داریم که تئوری و راه حل\u200cهای عملی برای چالش\u200cهای (1) که در برنامه\u200cهای مترابطه\u200cها در نقشه\u200cهای تفصیل\u200cسازی و آهنگ\u200cسازی برای رابطه\u200cهای (پایین) و عنوان\u200cهایی نامیده\u200cاند، توسعه\u200cسازی برای آنها با بار شناخته\u200cای تحمل کننده بر آهنگ\u200cکنندگان (3) ایجاد نمونه\u200cهای قابل استخراج مترابطه\u200cها، و مربوط به آن (۴) درباره مشکل داده\u200cهای محدودیت که توسط معرفی متا-رابطه به کار یادگیری افزایش داده شده است. ما کارهای اخیرا در رابطه استخراج در ارتباطات تحقیق می کنیم و در مورد نقشه هایمان صحبت می کنیم که رسماً رابطه های متا را برای دامنه های سلامتی که تولید شده از استفاده کننده تولید می کنیم، و یک مجموعه داده ای جدید، برنامه های اظهار و مدل های استخراج متا را', 'af': "Relasie uitpakking is 'n sleutel taak in kennis uitpakking, en is gewoonlik gedefinieerd as die taak van identifiseer verhouding wat tussen entiteite in teks hou. Hierdie thesis voorstel adres die spesifieke taak van die identifiseer van meta-relasies, 'n hoër volgorde familie van relasies natuurlik gebruik as houding tussen ander relasies wat tydelike, vergelykbaar en oorsaaklike relasies insluit. Gespesifieke is ons doel om teorieese onderstellings en praktiese oplossings te ontwikkel vir die uitdagings van (1) wat meta-relasies in konseptualiserings en annotasie skeme ingesluit word vir (laer volgorde) relasies en genaamde entiteite, (2) annotasie te kry vir hulle met tolerable kognitiewe laai op annotators, (3) skep modele wat betroubaar kan uittrek meta-relasies, en verwante met daardie (4) om die beperkte-data-probleem te raak wat deur die inligting van meta-relasies in die leer-taak gehandel word. Ons ondersoek onlangse werke in verwanting van uittrekking en bespreek ons planne om formeel meta-verwantings te konsepteer vir die domein van gebruiker genereerde gesondige teks en skep 'n nuwe dataset, annotasie skema en modele vir meta-verwanting uittrekking.", 'sq': 'Zgjidhja e marrëdhënieve është një detyrë kyçe në nxjerrjen e njohurive dhe përcaktohet si detyrë e identifikimit të marrëdhënieve që mbajnë midis njësive në tekst. Ky propozim thesis trajton detyrën specifike të identifikimit të meta-marrëdhënieve, një familje me rend më të lartë marrëdhënieve të interpretuara natyralisht si mbajtje midis marrëdhënieve të tjera që përfshin marrëdhënie të përkohshme, krahasuese dhe shkakuese. Më specifikisht, ne synojmë të zhvillojmë mbështetje teorike dhe zgjidhje praktike për sfidat e (1) përfshirjes së meta-marrëdhënieve në konceptualizime dhe skema anotacioni për marrëdhëniet (rendi më i ulët) dhe njësitë e emëruara, (2) marrjes së anotacioneve për ta me ngarkesë të tolerueshme kognitive mbi anotatorët, (3) krijimit të modeleve të aftë për të nxjerrë në mënyrë të besueshme meta-marrëdhëniet, - dhe lidhur me atë (4) trajtimin e problemit të të dhënave të kufizuara të përkeqësuar nga futja e meta-marrëdhënieve në detyrën e mësimit. Ne eksplorojmë punët e fundit në lidhje me nxjerrjen dhe diskutojmë planet tona për të konceptuar zyrtarisht meta-marrëdhëniet për fushën e teksteve shëndetësore të gjeneruar nga përdoruesit dhe për të krijuar një grup të ri të dhënash, skemë anotacioni dhe modele për nxjerrjen e meta-marrëdhënieve.', 'tr': 'Ilmi a çylmagyň esasy taýýarlanmasy bilen açylmagynyň esasy taýýarlanmasydir we olaryň esasy metin içindeki habarlaryň arasynda baglaýyşlary tanap maksady bolar. Bu tesis teklibi meta-baglaşyklary tanamak üçin belli zady çykýar, daşary düzümler maşgalasynyň daşary bolup geçirilýän başga baglaşyklaryň arasynda sag, hojalykly we sebäpli baglaşyklary bardyr. Adatça, biz teoriýaly taýýarlama we praktik çözümleri (1) meta-relasiýalary düşünjelendirmek we ýazgytlaşma şemalarına (düşük-düşük) we adly zatlar üçin (2) olaryň täsirli pikirli yüklemesi bilen duýdurmagy golaýlaýarys, (3) meta-relasiýalary ýüze çykyp biljek nusgalary bar, (4) öwrenmek işine meta-relasiýalaryň girişi tarapyndan süýtgedilen çykyş meselesini çözmekde (4) ýaly. Ýakyndaky işlerimizi tapmakda gözleýän we ulanylaryň sağlık metinleri üçin meta-ilişkilerini formally düşünmek üçin planlarymyzy taryşýarys we täze bir veri setir, duýgulama taslamasynda we meta-ilişkileri a çmak üçin örän düzgünlerimizi ýüze çykarýarys.', 'am': 'የግንኙነት ምርጫው እውቀት ማውጣት የቁልፍ ስራ ነው፣ እናም በተለየ ጊዜ በጽሑፍ አካባቢዎች መካከል የሚቆዩትን ግንኙነት የሚያረጋግጥ ስራ ነው፡፡ ይህ ተሳታፊ ጥያቄ ማህበራዊ ግንኙነትን ማረጋገጥ የተለየ ስራ፣ በጣራ፣ ትክክል እና የውይይት ግንኙነት መካከል በተለይ የግንኙነት ቤተሰቦችን በአዳማዊ ግንኙነት መካከል በመጠበቅ የተደረገውን ትክክል ያሳያል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ማተሚያ ግንኙነት እና አካባቢዎች (ታችኛዊ ክፍል) ተግባር እና ስርዓት (ታችኛዊ ክፍል) ተቃውሞ እና አካባቢዎችን ለመቀበል (2) በማስተካከል የሚችሉትን ምሳሌዎችን በመፍጠር የሚችሉትን (3) ምሳሌዎችን ለመፍጠር፣ ከዚህም (4) ጋር ለመማር ትምህርት ትምህርት ማግኘት የተደረገውን የዳታ ጉዳት ለመቀላቀል ነው፡፡ አዲስ የፍጥረት ጥያቄዎችን ለመፍጠር እና ለጥያቄ የሆኑት የጤናዊ ጽሑፎች ማህበራዊ ግንኙነትን ለመፍጠር እና አዲስ ዳታተር፣ ማስታወቂያ ፕሮግራሙን እና ምሳሌዎችን ለመውጣት እና እና አዲስ መፍጠር ማድረግ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'bn': 'জ্ঞান বিনিময়ে সম্পর্ক নির্বাচনের একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কাজ এবং সাধারণত লেখায় বস্তুর মধ্যে যে সম্পর্ক নির্ধারণ করে তার কাজ এই ধারণার প্রস্তাব মেটা-সম্পর্ক চিহ্নিত করার নির্দিষ্ট কাজ, স্বাভাবিকভাবে সম্পর্কের পরিবারের উচ্চ নির্দেশ দেয়া হয়েছে যার মধ্যে রয়েছে সাময়িক, ত আরো বিশেষ করে, আমরা চেষ্টা করছি যে মেটা সম্পর্কের চ্যালেঞ্জের জন্য তৈরি করা এবং বৈশিষ্ট্যগত সমাধান তৈরি করা যায় (১) ধারণা এবং নীচের সম্পর্কের (নীচের ক্ষেত্রে) এবং নামের বিভিন্ন সম্পর্কের মধ্যে যোগ দিয়ে (২) তাদের জন্য বি  and related to that (4) addressing the limited-data problem exacerbated by the introduction of meta-relations into the learning task.  আমরা সাম্প্রতিক কাজের সম্পর্কে খুঁজে বের করি এবং আমাদের পরিকল্পনা নিয়ে আলোচনা করি ব্যবহারকারীদের স্বাস্থ্য যোগাযোগ ব্যবহারকারীদের জন্য মেটা সম্পর্কের মাধ্যমে সম্পর্ক', 'hy': 'Հաբերությունների վերացումը գիտելիքների վերացման հիմնական խնդիր է, և ընդհանուր առմամբ սահմանվում է որպես հանձնարարություն նշել այն հարաբերությունները, որոնք տեքստում կազմում են կազմակերպությունների միջև: Այս թեզի առաջարկը վերաբերում է մետահարաբերությունների հայտնաբերման հատուկ խնդրին, հարաբերությունների ավելի բարձր համակարգ ընտանիքին, որը բնական կերպով վերաբերվում է այլ հարաբերությունների միջև, որոնք ներառում են ժամանակական, համեմատական և պատճառային հարաբերությունները: Ավելի հատկապես, մենք ձգտում ենք զարգացնել տեսական հիմքեր և պրակտիկ լուծումներ այն մարտահրավերների համար, որոնց նպատակն է (1) մետահարաբերությունները ներառել (ցածր կարգով) հարաբերությունների և նշումների ծրագրերի մեջ, (2) նրանց համար նշումներ ստանալ, որոնք թույլատրելի ճանաչողական բեռնությամբ են նշումների վրա, (3) ստեղ (4) լուծելով սահմանափակ տվյալների խնդիրը, որը կրկնվում է մետահարաբերությունների ներդրումով ուսուցման խնդրի մեջ: Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք վերջին աշխատանքները վերաբերյալ վերացման հարաբերությունների հետ և քննարկում ենք մեր ծրագրերը պաշտոնապես վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ օգտագործողների ստեղծված առողջապահության տեքստերի ոլորտում և ստեղծում ենք նոր տվյալների համակարգ, annoտացիոն սխ', 'az': 'İlişkil çıxartma elm çıxartmasında anahtar bir işdir, və sık-sık mətndə məlumatlar arasındakı ilişkiləri tanıtması üçün tanımlanır. Bu tez təbliği meta-ilişkilerini tanıtmaq üçün müəyyən bir görevi, doğal olaraq daha yüksək sıra ilişkilerin ailəsini, müxtəlif, saldırıcı və nedeniyyətli ilişkilerin arasında tutmaq üçün yaradılır. Daha müəyyən olaraq, biz (1) müsəlmanların meta-əlaqələrini konseptualizasyonlara və (düşük sırada) əlaqələrə və adlandırmaq üçün nəzəriyyətli dəyişiklik və praktik çətinliklərə təşkil etmək istəyirik, (2) onların əlaqələrinə sadəcə bilikli yüklə yazmaq, 3) meta-əlaqələrinə güvenilir təşkil edə biləcək modeller yaratmaq istəyirik. ( 4 ) məlumatların öyrənməsi işinə meta-ilişkilərin girişindən artırıldığı qurğulu məlumatların problemlərini çəkməyə çalışır. Biz yeni əməllərimizi istifadəçi yaratdığı sağlamlıq məktubların domeinin meta-ilişkilerini formül müzakirə etmək və meta-ilişkilerinin qovuşduğu məktubların yeni veri qurulması, annotasyon qurulması və modellərimizi yaratdıq.', 'cs': 'Extrakce vztahů je klíčovým úkolem v extrakci znalostí a je běžně definována jako úkol identifikovat vztahy mezi entitami v textu. Návrh diplomové práce se zabývá specifickým úkolem identifikace meta-vztahů, rodiny vztahů vyššího řádu přirozeně interpretovaných jako držení mezi jinými vztahy, které zahrnují časové, komparativní a kauzální vztahy. Konkrétněji se snažíme vytvořit teoretické základy a praktická řešení pro výzvy (1) začlenění metavztahů do konceptualizací a anotací schémat pro (nižší řád) vztahy a pojmenované entity, (2) získávání anotací pro ně s přijatelnou kognitivní zátěží anotátorů, (3) vytváření modelů schopných spolehlivě extrahovat metavztahy, a související s tím (4) řešení problému s omezenými daty zhoršeného zavedením metavztahů do učebního úkolu. Prozkoumáme nedávné práce v oblasti extrakce vztahů a diskutujeme naše plány formálně konceptualizovat meta-vztahy pro doménu uživatelsky generovaných textů zdraví, vytvořit novou datovou sadu, anotaci schéma a modely pro extrakci meta-vztahů.', 'ca': "L'extracció de relacions és una tasca clau en l'extracció del coneixement, i es defineix comument com la tasca d'identificar les relacions que tenen entre entitats en text. Aquesta proposta de tesi aborda la tasca específica d'identificar les metarelacions, una família d'ordre superior de relacions naturalment interpretada com manteniment entre altres relacions que inclouen relacions temporals, comparatives i causals. Més concretament, busquem desenvolupar fundaments teòrics i solucions pràctiques als reptes de (1) incorporar les metarelacions en conceptualitzacions i esquemes d'anotació per les relacions (d'ordre inferior) i entitats anomenades, (2) obtenir anotacions per ells amb una càrrega cognitiva tolerable en els anotators, (3) crear models capaços d'extrair de manera fiable les metarelacions, i relacionats amb això (4) abordant el problema limitat de dades exacerbat per l'introducció de metarelacions a la tasca d'aprenentatge. Explorem treballs recents en relació amb l'extracció i discutem els nostres plans de conceptualitzar formalment les metarelacions per al domini dels textos sanitaris generats per l'usuari, i crear un nou conjunt de dades, esquema d'anotació i models per l'extracció de metarelacions.", 'et': 'Suhete ekstraheerimine on teadmiste ekstraheerimise põhiülesanne ja seda määratletakse tavaliselt kui ülesannet tuvastada üksuste vahelised suhted tekstis. Käesolev lõputöö ettepanek käsitleb spetsiifilist ülesannet tuvastada metasuhted, kõrgema astme suhete perekond, mida loomulikult tõlgendatakse hoidmisena teiste suhete vahel, mis hõlmab ajalisi, võrdlevaid ja põhjuslikke suhteid. Täpsemalt püüame välja töötada teoreetilised alused ja praktilised lahendused väljakutsetele, mis on seotud (1) metasuhete kaasamisega (madalama järjekorra) suhete ja nimetatud üksuste kontseptuaalsetesse kontseptuaalsetesse ja annotatsiooniskeemidesse, (2) nende jaoks lubatava kognitiivse koormusega annotatoritele, (3) mudelite loomisega, mis suudavad usaldusväärselt metasuhteid ekstraheerida, (4) käsitleda piiratud andmete probleemi, mida süvendab metasuhete kasutuselevõtt õppeülesandesse. Uurime hiljutisi tööd seoste ekstraheerimisel ja arutame oma plaane ametlikult kontseptualiseerida metasuhteid kasutaja loodud tervisetekstide valdkonnas ning luua uus andmekogum, annotatsiooniskeem ja mudelid seoste ekstraheerimiseks.', 'bs': 'Ekstrakcija odnosa je ključni zadatak u izvlačenju znanja i obično se definira kao zadatak identifikacije odnosa koje imaju između entitata u tekstu. Ovaj prijedlog teze se bavi specifičnim zadatkom identifikacije meta-odnosa, višeg reda porodice odnosa koje prirodno smatra kao držanje između drugih odnosa koji uključuju temporalne, usporedbene i uzročne odnose. Posebno, ciljamo razviti teorijske temelje i praktične rješenja za izazove (1) uključujući metaodnose u konceptualizacije i annotacijske shme za (niže redove) odnose i imenovane entitate, (2) dobiti annotacije za njih sa tolerantnim kognitivnim teretom na annotatore, (3) stvaranje modela sposobnih pouzdanim izvlačenjem metaodnosa, i povezano s tim (4) rješavanjem problema sa ograničenim podacima koje je povećano uvođenjem metaodnosa u zadatak učenja. Istražujemo nedavne radove u odnosu na ekstrakciju odnosa i razgovaramo o našim planovima o formalnom konceptualizaciji metaodnosa za domenu zdravstvenih tekstova proizvođenih korisnika i stvaranju novog seta podataka, programa annotacije i modela ekstrakcije metaodnosa.', 'fi': 'Suhteen uuttaminen on avaintehtävä tiedon hankinnassa, ja se määritellään yleisesti tehtäväksi tunnistaa tekstissä entiteettien väliset suhteet. Tämä väitöskirja käsittelee erityistehtävää tunnistaa meta-suhteet, korkeamman luokan suhteet, joita luonnollisesti tulkitaan pitävän muiden suhteiden välillä, johon sisältyvät ajalliset, vertailevat ja kausaaliset suhteet. Tarkemmin sanottuna pyrimme kehittämään teoreettisia perusteita ja käytännöllisiä ratkaisuja haasteisiin, jotka liittyvät (1) metasuhteiden sisällyttämiseen (alemman järjestyksen) suhteiden ja nimettyjen entiteettien käsitteellistämiseen ja merkintäjärjestelmiin, (2) huomautusten hankkimiseen niille siedettävällä kognitiivisella kuormituksella, (3) mallien luomiseen, jotka pystyvät luotettavasti purkamaan metasuhteita, ja siihen liittyen (4) puuttua rajallisen datan ongelmaan, jota pahentaa metasuhteiden käyttöönotto oppimistehtävään. Tutkimme viimeaikaisia teoksia relaatiohaun saralla ja keskustelemme suunnitelmistamme muodollisesti konseptoida metasuhteet käyttäjien tuottamien terveystekstien saralla sekä luoda uuden aineiston, huomautusjärjestelmän ja mallien metasuhdehaun saralla.', 'jv': 'AllProgressBar proposal Awak dh챕w챕 wis nglanggar nggawe sistem theoretik karo perusahaan praksi kanggo dianggawe iki dadi (1) sing diranggawe meta-ratio nganggep nggawe barang kelangan karo perusahaan (bottom-order) lan nganggep sistem sing dibutuhke butuhan (2) sing berarti tau karo perusahaan kow챕 nggawe paten (3) sing iso nggawe model sing iso nggawe meta-ratio nggawe (4) Awak dh챕w챕 챕ntuk ng챕w챕 sistem sing nggawe barang ng챕w챕 gambar ng챕w챕 butar ng챕w챕, ng챕w챕 sawar ng챕w챕 ng챕w챕 sistem dh챕w챕 ng챕w챕 meta-ratio ng챕w챕 gambar ng챕w챕-pengguna kuwi ng챕w챕 gambar ng챕w챕, gawe ng챕w챕 dataset, bulleturan scheme lan model kang', 'sk': 'Pridobivanje odnosov je ključna naloga pri pridobivanju znanja in je običajno opredeljena kot naloga identifikacije odnosov med entitetami v besedilu. Predlog diplomske naloge obravnava specifično nalogo identifikacije metaodnosov, družine odnosov višjega reda, ki se naravno razlaga kot druženje med drugimi odnosi, ki vključuje časovne, primerjalne in vzročne odnose. Natančneje si prizadevamo razviti teoretične podlage in praktične rešitve za izzive (1) vključevanja metarelacij v konceptualizacije in sheme označevanja (nižjega reda) relacij in imenovanih entitet, (2) pridobivanja označb zanje s sprejemljivo kognitivno obremenitvijo na označevalcih, (3) ustvarjanja modelov, ki so sposobni zanesljivo ekstrahirati metarelacije, (4) obravnavanje problema omejenega obsega podatkov, ki ga je še poslabšala uvedba metaodnosov v učno nalogo. Raziskujemo najnovejša dela na področju ekstrakcije relacij in razpravljamo o načrtih formalne konceptualizacije metarelacij za področje uporabnikov generiranih zdravstvenih besedil ter ustvarimo nov nabor podatkov, shemo opomb in modele ekstrakcije metarelacij.', 'he': 'מחלץ מערכות יחסים הוא משימה מפתחת בחלץ ידע, והיא מוגדרת בדרך כלל כמשימה לזהות מערכות יחסים בין יחידות בטקסט. הצעת התזה הזאת מתייחסת למשימה המיוחדת לזהות מערכות יחסים מטה, משפחת מערכות מערכות יחסים גבוהות יותר שמופרסמת באופן טבעי כחיבוק בין מערכות יחסים אחרות שכוללות מערכות יחסים זמניות, משוואות, וסיביות. במיוחד יותר, אנו מתכוונים לפתח תוכניות תיאורטיות ופתרונות מעשיות לאתגרים של (1) הכילוי מערכות יחסים מטה לתוכניות מושג ומערכות ציונים למערכות יחסים (סדר נמוך) ושמות בשם, (2) להשיג ציונים להם עם עומס קוגניטיבי סבלני על ציונים, (3) ליצור מודלים מסוגלים להוציא ביטחון מערכות יחסים מטה, ) ובקשר לזה (4) להתמודד עם בעיית הנתונים המוגבלות שמחמקת על ידי הכניסה של מערכות יחסים מטה למשימת הלימוד. אנו חוקרים עבודות לאחרונה בנוגע לחלץ יחסים ודיונים על התוכניות שלנו להבין רשמית יחסים מטה לתחום של טקסטים בריאותיים יוצרים ע"י משתמשים, וליצור קבוצת נתונים חדשה, תכנית ציונים ומודלים לחלץ יחסים מטה.', 'ha': "Cire shirin haɗi yana da maɓallin aikin da za'a zartar da ilmi, kuma ana ƙayyade shi a mara ɗabi'a kamar aikin wanda ya gane wa tsaro da ke tsare tsakanin abun cikin matsayi. Wannan littafin da aka ƙulla wani aikin da za'a gane danganta meta-linki, wata jama'a mafi girma wa dangantaka a naturally da tsari a tsakanin danganda wasu danganniya da ke haɗi tsakanin kashi, da fasa, da samuraci da danganci na saba. More specifically, we aim to develop theoretical underpinnings and practical solutions for the challenges of (1) incorporating meta-relations into conceptualisations and annotation schemes for (lower-order) relations and named entities, (2) obtaining annotations for them with tolerable cognitive load on annotators, (3) creating models capable of reliably extracting meta-relations, na da yana da (4) addressa masu cikin ma'abũcin data da aka batar da shi na ƙara-dangancin meta-tsari cikin aikin da aka karanta. Tuna ƙidãya aikin da ke cikin muhimman zartar da kuma Muke jãyayya kwamfyutan mu don a samu'a ɗabi'a wa matsayin meta-linki wa madamfyutan da aka haife shi na mai amfani da shi, kuma mu sami wani sabo na danganta, shirin zartarwa da misãlai na cire-sami.", 'bo': 'འབྲེལ་བ་ཕྱིར་འདོན་ནི་ཤེས་ཡོད་པའི་འཕར་རིས་དམིགས་ཀྱི་གཙོ་ཆོག་གི་ལས་ཀ་རེད། སྤྱིར་བཏང་ནི་ཡིག འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་བསམ་ཚུལ་འདིས་meta-relations་རུ་དམིགས་བསལ་བ་ཁག་པོ་ཞིག་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་པའི་ནང་གི་གོ་རིམ་མཐུན་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་འདུག ང་ཚོས་ཁྱད་པར་གསལ་བཤད་པ་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་གོ་སྐབས་theoretical underpinnings and practical solutions for the challenges of (1)ནང་དུ་meta-relations་ཚུལ་ཕྱོགས་དང་བསྟུན་གསལ་བཤད་དབྱེ་རིམ་དང་མིང་འཛུགས་དགོས། (4)ནང་དུ་ཕྱིར་མཐུན་གྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཆེ་བ་དག་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ནི་ ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་དུས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་དང་བསྟུན་ནས་ང་ཚོའི་འཆར་གཞི་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གླེང་འཚོལ་བ་དང་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་domain of user-generated health texts་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་གཏོང'}
{'en': 'Beyond the English Web : Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual and Lightweight Monolingual Classification of Registers', 'ar': 'ما وراء شبكة الويب الإنجليزية: تصنيف السجلات متعدد اللغات وخفيف الوزن أحادي اللغة بدون طلقة', 'pt': 'Além da Web em Inglês: Classificação Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual e Lightweight Monolingual de Registros', 'es': 'Más allá de la web en inglés: clasificación de registros monolingüe ligera y multilingüe de tiro cero', 'fr': 'Au-delà du Web anglais\xa0: classification polyglotte et monolingue légère des registres', 'ja': '英語ウェブを超えて：レジスタのゼロショットクロスリンガルと軽量モノリンガル分類', 'zh': '越英语网络:寄存器之零镜头言语与轻量级单语类', 'hi': 'अंग्रेजी वेब से परे: शून्य-शॉट क्रॉस-लिंगुअल और हल्के मोनोलिंगुअल रजिस्टरों का वर्गीकरण', 'ru': '"Beyond the English Web: Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual and Lightweight Monolingual Classification of Registers"', 'ga': 'Thar an nGréasán Béarla: Aicmiú Aonteangach Clár Trastheangach agus Éadroma Neamh-Shot', 'hu': 'Az angol weben túl: Zero-Shot többnyelvű és könnyű egynyelvű nyilvántartások osztályozása', 'ka': 'ინგლისური საბეჭის გარეშე: ნულ-სურათი კრისიგუალური და სიმართლური მონოლინგური კლასიფიკაცია რეგისტრების', 'el': 'Πέρα από τον Αγγλικό Ιστό: Μηδέν-Shot Cross-Lingual και Ελαφριά Μονόγλωσση Ταξινόμηση Μητρώων', 'it': 'Oltre il Web inglese: Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual e Leggera Classificazione Monolingue dei Registri', 'kk': 'Ағылшын Веб арасындағы нөл-түрлі тілі және ағылшын тілі және бір тілі регистр классификациясы', 'mk': 'Покрај англискиот веб: Нулична крстојанска и лесна монолингуална класификација на регистрите', 'ml': 'ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് വെബ്ബിനു മുകളില്\u200d: പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വെടി- ഷോട്ട് ക്രോസ്- ലിങ്ഗലും ലളിതമായ മോണോളിഗ്ലേഷല്\u200d ക്ലാസിഷഷന്\u200d', 'mt': 'Lil hinn mill-Internet Ingliż: Klassifikazzjoni ta’ Reġistri Monolingwali Żero-Shot Cross-Lingwali u Ħfief', 'ms': 'Beyond the English Web: Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual and Lightweight Monolingual Classification of Registers', 'mn': 'Англи хэлний веб-ээс гадна Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual, Lightweight Monolingual Classification of Registers', 'no': 'Utan engelsk nett: 0-Shot Cross-Lingual og Lightweight Monolingual Classification of Registers', 'pl': 'Poza angielską siecią Web: Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual and Lightweight Monolingual Classification of Register', 'si': 'ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වෙබ් වලින්: Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual සහ Light weight Monolingual Classication of Recorders', 'ro': 'Dincolo de web-ul englez: Clasificarea interlingvistică și monolingvă ușoară a registrelor', 'sr': 'Iza Engleskog mreža: nulo-pucanje preko-Linguala i lagane monolingviske klasifikacije registracija', 'so': 'Bogga Ingiriiska', 'ta': '@ info: whatsthis', 'ur': 'انگلیسی ویب کے کنارے: صفر-شٹ کرس-لینگئال اور ہلکا وزن راجستر کی ایک دوسری زبان کا کلاسیفٹ', 'sv': 'Bortom den engelska webben: Zero-Shot tvärspråklig och lätt enspråkig klassificering av register', 'lt': 'Beyond the English Web: Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual and Lightweight Monolingual Classification of Registers', 'uz': 'Inglizcha veb- sahifani ochish', 'vi': 'Không hiểu tiếng Anh: Sắp xếp độc ngôn ngữ vô ngôn ngữ', 'da': 'Udover det engelske web: Zero-Shot tværsproglig og letvægts ensproget klassificering af registre', 'bg': 'Отвъд английската мрежа: нулева стрелба кръстосана езикова и лека едноезична класификация на регистрите', 'hr': 'Iza Engleske mreže: nulo-pucanje preko-Lingualne i lagane monolingviske klasifikacije registracija', 'nl': 'Beyond the English Web: Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual en Lightweight Monolingual Classification of Registers', 'de': 'Jenseits des englischen Web: Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual und Leichte Monolingual Classification of Registers', 'fa': 'بیرون وب انگلیسی: کلاس\u200cبندی\u200cهای نوشته\u200cهای نوشته\u200c', 'id': 'Di luar Web Inggris: Klasifikasi Monolingual Sederhana Semula-Shot', 'ko': '영어 네트워크 이외: 언어 영역의 영도 크로스 언어와 경량급 단어 분류', 'af': 'Buitend die Engelske Web: Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual en Ligte Gewig Monolingueel Klassifikasie van Registers', 'sq': 'Përtej rrjetit anglez: Klasifikimi i regjistrave me gjuhë zero dhe monolinguale të lehtë', 'sw': 'Zaidi ya tovuti ya Kiingereza: Kupigwa risasi kwa lugha-lugha na Ukosoaji wa Kimonolinguli', 'tr': 'Iňlisçe Web tarapyndan: Zero-Shot Çaltylyk we Haýyklyk Monoli Diller Registeriň Klassifikasi', 'am': 'እንግሊዘኛ ድረ ገጽ: Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual and Lightweight Monolingual Classification of Registers', 'az': "İngilizci İnternet'in ardınca: Sıfır-Shot-Cross-Lingual və Haqq-Haqq Monolingual Classification of Registers", 'hy': "Անգլերեն վեբ-ի կողմից' զրո-կրակի խաչլեզու և թեթև միալեզու ռեստորանների դասակարգման", 'bn': 'ইংরেজি ওয়েবের পাশে: শুট ক্রস-লিঙ্গুয়াল এবং হালকা মোনোলিঙ্গুয়াল ক্লাসিশন অফ রেজিস্টার', 'bs': 'Iza Engleskog interneta: nulo-pucanje preko-Linguala i lagane monolingviske klasifikacije registracija', 'fi': 'Beyond the English Web: Zero-Shot monikielinen ja kevyt yksikielinen rekisteriluokitus', 'cs': 'Za anglickým webem: Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual a lehká jednojjazyčná klasifikace registrů', 'ca': 'Al llarg de la Web anglesa: Classificació monolíngua de registres de zero dispars', 'et': 'Lisaks inglise veebilehele: Zero-Shot keeleülene ja kerge ühekeelne registrite klassifikatsioon', 'sk': 'Zunaj angleškega spleta: Zero-Shot medjezikovna in lahka enojezična klasifikacija registrov', 'jv': 'Ngawe Bukak Inggris web: 0-shot', 'he': 'מעבר לרשת האנגלית: שיעור מונולינגולי של רשומות ללא יריות', 'ha': '@ item Spelling dictionary', 'bo': 'Beyond the English Web: Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual and Lightweight Monolingual Classification of Registers'}
{'en': 'We explore cross-lingual transfer of register classification for web documents. Registers, that is, text varieties such as blogs or news are one of the primary predictors of linguistic variation and thus affect the automatic processing of language. We introduce two new register-annotated corpora, FreCORE and SweCORE, for French and Swedish. We demonstrate that deep pre-trained language models perform strongly in these languages and outperform previous state-of-the-art in English and Finnish. Specifically, we show 1) that zero-shot cross-lingual transfer from the large English CORE corpus can match or surpass previously published monolingual models, and 2) that lightweight monolingual classification requiring very little training data can reach or surpass our zero-shot performance. We further analyse classification results finding that certain registers continue to pose challenges in particular for cross-lingual transfer.', 'ar': 'نستكشف النقل متعدد اللغات لتصنيف السجل لوثائق الويب. تعتبر السجلات ، أي أنواع النص مثل المدونات أو الأخبار أحد المؤشرات الأولية للتنوع اللغوي وبالتالي تؤثر على المعالجة التلقائية للغة. نقدم شركتين جديدتين مشروحتين بالتسجيل ، وهما FreCORE و SweCORE ، للفرنسية والسويدية. نثبت أن نماذج اللغة العميقة المدربة مسبقًا تؤدي أداءً قويًا في هذه اللغات وتتفوق في الأداء على أحدث ما توصلت إليه اللغة الإنجليزية والفنلندية. على وجه التحديد ، نوضح 1) أن النقل بدون طلقة عبر اللغات من مجموعة CORE الإنجليزية الكبيرة يمكن أن يتطابق أو يتجاوز النماذج أحادية اللغة المنشورة مسبقًا ، و 2) أن التصنيف أحادي اللغة خفيف الوزن الذي يتطلب القليل جدًا من بيانات التدريب يمكن أن يصل أو يتجاوز أداء التسديدة الصفرية. . نقوم أيضًا بتحليل نتائج التصنيف التي توصلنا إلى أن بعض السجلات لا تزال تطرح تحديات على وجه الخصوص في النقل عبر اللغات.', 'pt': 'Exploramos a transferência multilíngue de classificação de registro para documentos da web. Registros, ou seja, variedades de texto, como blogs ou notícias, são um dos principais preditores de variação linguística e, portanto, afetam o processamento automático da linguagem. Apresentamos dois novos corpora anotados por registro, FreCORE e SweCORE, para francês e sueco. Demonstramos que os modelos de linguagem pré-treinados profundos têm um desempenho forte nesses idiomas e superam o estado da arte anterior em inglês e finlandês. Especificamente, mostramos 1) que a transferência multilíngue de tiro zero do grande corpus CORE inglês pode corresponder ou superar os modelos monolíngues publicados anteriormente e 2) que a classificação monolíngue leve que requer muito poucos dados de treinamento pode alcançar ou superar nosso desempenho de tiro zero . Analisamos ainda os resultados da classificação, constatando que certos registros continuam a representar desafios, em particular para a transferência entre idiomas.', 'es': 'Exploramos la transferencia multilingüe de la clasificación de registros para documentos web. Los registros, es decir, las variedades de texto, como blogs o noticias, son uno de los principales predictores de la variación lingüística y, por lo tanto, afectan al procesamiento automático del lenguaje. Presentamos dos nuevos corpus anotados por registro, FREcore y SweCore, para francés y sueco. Demostramos que los modelos lingüísticos profundos y preentrenados tienen un gran rendimiento en estos idiomas y superan a los últimos avances en inglés y finlandés. Específicamente, mostramos 1) que la transferencia interlingüística de tiro cero desde el gran corpus CORE en inglés puede igualar o superar los modelos monolingües publicados anteriormente, y 2) que la clasificación monolingüe ligera que requiere muy pocos datos de entrenamiento puede alcanzar o superar nuestro rendimiento cero. Analizamos más a fondo los resultados de la clasificación y descubrimos que ciertos registros siguen planteando desafíos, en particular para la transferencia multilingüe.', 'fr': "Nous explorons le transfert multilingue de classification de registre pour les documents Web. Les registres, c'est-à-dire les variétés de texte tels que les blogs ou les actualités, sont l'un des principaux prédicteurs de la variation linguistique et affectent donc le traitement automatique de la langue. Nous introduisons deux nouveaux corpus annotés par le registre, FreCore et SweCore, pour le français et le suédois. Nous démontrons que les modèles linguistiques pré-entraînés sont très performants dans ces langues et surpassent les dernières avancées en anglais et en finnois. Plus précisément, nous montrons 1) que le transfert interlinguistique zero-shot à partir du vaste corpus anglais CORE peut correspondre ou surpasser les modèles monolingues publiés précédemment, et 2) que la classification monolingue légère nécessitant très peu de données d'entraînement peut atteindre ou dépasser nos performances zero-shot. Nous analysons plus en détail les résultats de classification et constatons que certains registres continuent de poser des problèmes, en particulier pour le transfert interlinguistique.", 'ja': 'Web文書のレジスタ分類のクロスリンガル転送を模索しています。レジスタ、すなわち、ブログやニュースなどのテキスト品種は、言語変動の主要な予測因子の1つであり、したがって、言語の自動処理に影響を与えます。フランス語とスウェーデン語の2つの新しい登録注釈付きコーパ、FreCOREとSweCOREを紹介します。私たちは、深い事前トレーニングを受けた言語モデルがこれらの言語で強力にパフォーマンスし、英語とフィンランド語でこれまでの最先端を上回っていることを実証します。具体的には、1 ）大規模な英語のコアコーパスからのゼロショットのクロスリンガル転送が、以前に発表されたモノリンガルモデルと一致または上回る可能性があること、2 ）トレーニングデータが非常に少ない軽量のモノリンガル分類が、ゼロショットのパフォーマンスに到達または上回る可能性があることを示している。さらに、特定のレジスタが、特にクロスリンガル転送に課題を引き続きもたらすことを発見した分類結果を分析する。', 'hi': 'हम वेब दस्तावेजों के लिए रजिस्टर वर्गीकरण के क्रॉस-लिंगुअल हस्तांतरण का पता लगाते हैं। रजिस्टर, अर्थात्, ब्लॉग या समाचार जैसी पाठ किस्में भाषाई भिन्नता के प्राथमिक भविष्यवाणियों में से एक हैं और इस प्रकार भाषा के स्वचालित प्रसंस्करण को प्रभावित करती हैं। हम फ्रेंच और स्वीडिश के लिए दो नए रजिस्टर-एनोटेट कॉर्पोरेट, FreCORE और SweCORE पेश करते हैं। हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि गहरे पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल इन भाषाओं में दृढ़ता से प्रदर्शन करते हैं और अंग्रेजी और फिनिश में पिछले अत्याधुनिक से आगे निकल जाते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम 1) दिखाते हैं कि बड़े अंग्रेजी कोर कॉर्पस से शून्य-शॉट क्रॉस-लिंगुअल ट्रांसफर पहले प्रकाशित मोनोलिंगुअल मॉडल से मेल खा सकता है या पार कर सकता है, और 2) कि हल्के मोनोलिंगुअल वर्गीकरण के लिए बहुत कम प्रशिक्षण डेटा की आवश्यकता होती है, जो हमारे शून्य-शॉट प्रदर्शन तक पहुंच या पार कर सकता है। हम आगे वर्गीकरण परिणामों का विश्लेषण करते हैं कि कुछ रजिस्टर क्रॉस-लिंगुअल हस्तांतरण के लिए विशेष रूप से चुनौतियों का सामना करना जारी रखते हैं।', 'zh': '探网络文档注册类语移。 寄存器者,博客新闻之变体,言语之变,故动于言者也。 引入两新注注语料库,FreCORE、SweCORE,施于法语、瑞典语。 吾证深言之劲,而优于先进之英语芬兰语。 1)自英语CORE语料库零次跨语移匹过前单语,及2)须少练数轻量级单语分类过我者。 分析分类,寄存器挑战,特为跨语所移。', 'ru': 'Мы изучаем возможность кросс-лингвистического переноса классификации реестров для веб-документов. Регистры, то есть текстовые разновидности, такие как блоги или новости, являются одним из основных прогностических факторов языковой вариации и, таким образом, влияют на автоматическую обработку языка. Мы представляем две новые аннотированные к регистру корпорации - FreCORE и SweCORE - для французского и шведского языков. Мы демонстрируем, что языковые модели с глубоким предварительным обучением хорошо работают на этих языках и превосходят предыдущий уровень успеваемости на английском и финском языках. В частности, мы показываем 1) что кросс-лингвистическая передача с нулевым выстрелом из большого корпуса английского ЯДРА может соответствовать или превосходить ранее опубликованные одноязычные модели, и 2) что легкая одноязычная классификация, требующая очень мало данных для обучения, может достигать или превосходить нашу производительность с нулевым выстрелом. Мы далее анализируем результаты классификации, обнаружив, что некоторые регистры продолжают создавать проблемы, в частности, для межязыковой передачи.', 'ga': 'Déanaimid iniúchadh ar aistriú tras-teanga aicmiú cláir do dhoiciméid gréasáin. Tá cláir, is é sin, cineálacha téacs mar bhlaganna nó nuacht ar cheann de na príomh-réamhmheastacháin ar éagsúlacht teanga agus mar sin bíonn tionchar acu ar phróiseáil uathoibríoch teanga. Tugaimid isteach dhá chorpora nua ar an gclár, FreCORE agus SweCORE, don Fhraincis agus don tSualainnis. Léirímid go bhfeidhmíonn múnlaí teanga domhain réamhoilte go láidir sna teangacha seo agus go n-éiríonn leo níos fearr ná an ceann is nua-aimseartha sa Bhéarla agus san Fhionlainnis. Go sonrach, léirímid 1) gur féidir le haistriú trasteangach gan urchar ón gcorpas mór Béarla CORE samhlacha aonteangacha a foilsíodh roimhe seo a mheaitseáil nó a shárú, agus 2) gur féidir le haicmiú éadrom aonteangach a éilíonn fíorbheagán sonraí oiliúna ár bhfeidhmíocht náid lámhaigh a bhaint amach nó a shárú. . Déanaimid anailís bhreise ar thorthaí aicmithe ag fáil amach go leanann cláir áirithe ag cruthú dúshláin go háirithe maidir le haistriú tras-teanga.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ვებ დოკუმენტებისთვის რეგისტრისტის კლასიფიკაციის კონფიგურაციას გავაკეთებთ. როგორც ბლოგები ან ახალგაზები არის ლენგურისტიკური განრავლების პირველი პროგრამეტრების ერთი, და ამიტომ ენის ავტომატიკური პროცესის შესახებ. ჩვენ შევცვალოთ ორი ახალი რეგისტრისტური ანოტირებული კოპორა, FreCORE და SweCORE, ფრანგური და შვედიული. ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ძალიან უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო მსგავსი ენაში და უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ 1) ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ უფრო ცოტა სიტყვალური კოპორსისგან დიდი ინგლისური CORE კოპორსისგან შეგვიძლია თავისთან ან გადავიტანოთ წინ მონოლენგური მოდელები და 2) რომ ჩვენ დამატებით კლასიფიკაციის შედეგი ანალიზაცია, რომელიც განსაკუთრებული რეგისტრისები უნდა გავამუშავებთ განსაკუთრებები განსაკუთრებულად კრესიფიკაცი', 'hu': 'Vizsg찼ljuk a webes dokumentumok nyilv찼ntart찼sbasorol찼s찼nak nyelvek k철z철tti tov찼bb챠t찼s찼t. A nyelvi vari찼ci처 egyik els흷dleges el흷rejelz흷je a regiszterek, azaz a sz철vegv찼ltozatok, mint p챕ld찼ul a blogok vagy a h챠rek, 챕s 챠gy befoly찼solj찼k a nyelv automatikus feldolgoz찼s찼t. Bemutatunk k챕t 첬j, regisztr찼lt jegyzetekkel ell찼tott korpora-t, a FreCORE-t 챕s a SweCORE-t, francia 챕s sv챕d nyelven. Bemutatjuk, hogy a m챕lyrehat처, el흷re k챕pzett nyelvi modellek er흷sen teljes챠tenek ezeken a nyelveken, 챕s fel체lm첬lj찼k a kor찼bbi legmodernebb angol 챕s finn nyelveket. Konkr챕tan 1) azt mutatjuk meg, hogy a nagy angol CORE korpuszb처l sz찼rmaz처 z챕r처, keresztnyelv킥 transzfer megegyezik vagy meghaladja a kor찼bban publik찼lt egynyelv킥 modelleket, 챕s 2) hogy a nagyon kev챕s edz챕si adatot ig챕nyl흷 k철nny킥, egynyelv킥 oszt찼lyoz찼s el챕rheti vagy meghaladhatja a z챕r처 l철v챕si teljes챠tm챕ny체nket. Tov찼bb찼 elemezz체k az oszt찼lyoz찼si eredm챕nyeket, 챕s meg찼llap챠tjuk, hogy bizonyos nyilv찼ntart찼sok tov찼bbra is kih챠v찼sokat jelentenek, k체l철n철sen a nyelvek k철z철tti transzfer tekintet챕ben.', 'el': 'Ερευνούμε τη διασυνοριακή μεταφορά της ταξινόμησης μητρώου για διαδικτυακά έγγραφα. Τα μητρώα, δηλαδή οι ποικιλίες κειμένου όπως τα ιστολόγια ή τα νέα είναι ένας από τους κύριους παράγοντες πρόβλεψης της γλωσσικής διακύμανσης και επηρεάζουν έτσι την αυτόματη επεξεργασία της γλώσσας. Παρουσιάζουμε δύο νέα σώματα με σημειώσεις μητρώου, FreCORE και SweCORE, για γαλλικά και σουηδικά. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι τα βαθιά προ-εκπαιδευμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα αποδίδουν έντονα σε αυτές τις γλώσσες και ξεπερνούν τα προηγούμενα σύγχρονα αγγλικά και φινλανδικά. Συγκεκριμένα, καταδεικνύουμε 1) ότι η μηδενική διασταυρούμενη μεταφορά από το μεγάλο αγγλικό σώμα μπορεί να ταιριάζει ή να ξεπεράσει προηγουμένως δημοσιευμένα μονογλωσσικά μοντέλα και 2) ότι η ελαφριά μονογλωσσική ταξινόμηση που απαιτεί πολύ λίγα δεδομένα προπόνησης μπορεί να φτάσει ή να ξεπεράσει την απόδοση μηδενικής βολής. Αναλύουμε περαιτέρω τα αποτελέσματα ταξινόμησης και διαπιστώνουμε ότι ορισμένα μητρώα εξακολουθούν να θέτουν προκλήσεις, ιδίως για τη διασυνοριακή μεταφορά.', 'it': "Esaminiamo il trasferimento multilingue della classificazione dei registri per i documenti web. I registri, cioè le varietà di testo come blog o notizie, sono uno dei principali predittori della variazione linguistica e quindi influenzano l'elaborazione automatica della lingua. Vi presentiamo due nuovi corpora annotati nel registro, FreCORE e SweCORE, per il francese e lo svedese. Dimostriamo che i modelli linguistici pre-addestrati funzionano fortemente in queste lingue e superano i precedenti stati dell'arte in inglese e finlandese. Nello specifico, mostriamo 1) che il trasferimento translinguale zero-shot dal grande corpus inglese CORE può corrispondere o superare i modelli monolingue precedentemente pubblicati, e 2) che la classificazione monolingue leggera che richiede pochissimi dati di allenamento può raggiungere o superare le nostre prestazioni zero-shot. Analizziamo ulteriormente i risultati della classificazione rilevando che alcuni registri continuano a rappresentare sfide, in particolare per il trasferimento multilingue.", 'mk': 'Истражуваме прекујазички трансфер на класификација на регистрите за веб документи. Регистрите, значи, текстовите различности како што се блоговите или вестите се еден од главните предвидувачи на јазичката варијација и со тоа влијаат на автоматското обработување на јазикот. Претставуваме две нови регистрирани капори, ФРЕКОР и Шведски, за француски и шведски. Демонстрираме дека длабоко предобучените јазички модели функционираат силно на овие јазици и ги надминуваат претходните најнови на англиски и фински јазик. Специфично, покажуваме 1) дека нула-стрелка крстојазичен трансфер од големиот англиски корпус CORE може да се совпаѓа или да се надмине претходно објавени монојазични модели, и 2) дека лесната монојазична класификација која бара многу малку податоци за обука може да ја достигне или надмине нашата нула- We further analyse classification results finding that certain registers continue to pose challenges in particular for cross-lingual transfer.', 'lt': 'Tiriame tarpkalbinį internetinių dokumentų registrų klasifikavimo perdavimą. Registers, that is, text varieties such as blogs or news are one of the primary predictors of linguistic variation and thus affect the automatic processing of language.  Prancūzų ir švedų kalbomis pristatome dvi naujas registre anotuotas korporas FreCORE ir SweCORE. Mes parodome, kad giliai iš anksto parengti kalbų modeliai šiomis kalbomis labai veiksmingi ir yra aukštesni už ankstesnę pažangą anglų ir suomių kalbomis. Konkrečiai, mes rodome 1) kad nulinio nuotraukos tarpkalbinis perdavimas iš didelio anglų CORE korpuso gali atitikti arba viršyti anksčiau paskelbtus monokalbinius modelius, ir 2) kad lengva monokalbinė klasifikacija, reikalaujanti labai mažų mokymo duomenų, gali pasiekti arba viršyti mūsų nulinio nuotraukos rezultatus. We further analyse classification results finding that certain registers continue to pose challenges in particular for cross-lingual transfer.', 'kk': 'Біз веб құжаттар үшін регистрациялау классификациясының көптеген тілдерді тасымалдау тілдерін іздейміз. Блог не жаңалықтар секілді мәтін түрлері лингвистикалық өзгерістердің негізгі таңдаушыларының бірі, сондықтан тілді автоматты түрде өзгерту әрекетіне әсер етеді. Біз француз және Швеция үшін қорпора, FreCORE және SweCORE үшін екі жаңа регистр жазылған корпора таныстық. Біз алдын- ала оқылған тіл үлгілерін бұл тілдерде күшті жұмыс істеп, алдыңғы ағылшын және Финляндық тілдерінде орындау үлгілерін көрсетедік. Ескертулік, біз 1) үлкен ағылшын корпустағы нөл тілді көпшілік аударуын көрсетедік. Бұл үлкен ағылшын CORE корпустағы бірнеше тілді монолингі үлгілеріне сәйкес келеді немесе өзгерте алады, және 2) бірнеше тілд Біз бірнеше тілдерді көп тілдерге ауыстыру үшін бұл жағдайларды жалғастырып тұрады.', 'ms': 'Kami mengeksplorasi pemindahan saling bahasa klasifikasi daftar untuk dokumen web. Daftar, iaitu, jenis teks seperti blog atau berita adalah salah satu prediktor utama variasi bahasa dan oleh itu mempengaruhi pemprosesan automatik bahasa. We introduce two new register-annotated corpora, FreCORE and SweCORE, for French and Swedish.  Kami menunjukkan bahawa model bahasa yang dilatih-dilatih mendalam berjalan kuat dalam bahasa-bahasa ini dan melampaui kemajuan-kemajuan terdahulu dalam bahasa Inggeris dan Finlandia. Secara khusus, kita tunjukkan 1) bahawa pemindahan saling bahasa 0-shot dari korpus besar CORE Inggeris boleh sepadan atau melebihi model monobahasa yang telah diterbitkan sebelumnya, dan 2) bahawa kelasukan monobahasa ringan yang memerlukan data latihan sangat sedikit boleh mencapai atau melebihi prestasi zero-shot kami. Kami analisis lebih lanjut keputusan klasifikasi mencari bahawa terdapat daftar tertentu terus menantang terutama untuk pemindahan saling bahasa.', 'ml': 'We explore cross-lingual transfer of register classification for web documents.  രേജിസ്റ്റര്\u200dസ്, വ്യാജങ്ങളോ വാര്\u200dത്തകളോ പോലുള്ള വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d ഭാഷ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങളുടെ പ്രധാനപ്രവചനങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒന്നാണ്. അതുകൊ രണ്ടു പുതിയ റെജിസ്റ്റര്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പോര്\u200d, ഫ്രെക്കോര്\u200d, സ്വീക്കോര്\u200d, ഫ്രെഞ്ച് ഫ്രെഞ്ചും സ്വീഡിഷ്ട് ആഴത്തെ പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഈ ഭാഷകളില്\u200d ശക്തിയോടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു എന്നും മുമ്പ് ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലും ഫിന് പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d 1 കാണിക്കുന്നു, വലിയ ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d നിന്നും സൂക്ഷ്മഭാഷ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് മുമ്പ് പ്രസിദ്ധീകരിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് മാത്രം പൊരുതാന കുറച്ചു രേജിസ്റ്റര്\u200dസ് പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നത് കൂടുതല', 'no': 'Vi utforskar fleirspråk overføring av registerklassifikasjon for nettdokument. Registrerar, som er tekstvariasjonar som blogar eller nyhetar, er ein av dei primære foregåande av språk variasjonar og derfor påvirkar den automatiske prosesseringa av språk. Vi introduserer to nye registrerte korpora, FreCORE og SweCORE for fransk og svensk. Vi demonstrerer at dype språk-modeller utfører sterkt i desse språka og utfører tidlegare kunststand i engelsk og finnsk. Spesielt viser vi 1) at krysspråk-overføring av nullstart frå den store engelske CORE-korpusen kan passa eller overføre tidlegare publiserte monospråk-modeller, og 2) at lett monospråk-klassifikasjon som krev svært lite opplæringsdata kan nå eller overføre våre nullstatt. Vi analyserer fleire klassifikasjonslingsresultater med å finna at nokre registrer fortsetter å posera utfordringar spesielt for krysspråk overføring.', 'mn': 'Бид веб баримтуудын регистр хуваалцааны олон хэлний шилжүүлэлтийг судалж байна. Блог эсвэл мэдээг зэрэг текст төрлүүд нь хэлний өөрчлөлтийн анхны таамаглаачдын нэг юм. Тиймээс хэлний автоматжуулалтын үйлдвэрлэлд нөлөөлдөг. Бид Француз болон Швед хоёр шинэ бичсэн корпора, FreCORE болон SweCORE-г танилцуулдаг. Бид эдгээр хэл дээр гүн гүнзгий сургалтын хэл загварууд маш хүчтэй ажиллаж, Англи болон Финляндын урлагийн хувьд илүү өнгөрсөн байдал хийдэг. Тодорхой хэлбэрээр бид 1) Англи хэлний CORE корпус-ын 0-шууд хэлний шилжүүлэлт нь өмнө нь нэг хэлний загварыг хэвлэгдсэн эсвэл хамгийн бага хэлний нэг хэлний хэлбэрээр хэвлэгдсэн хэлбэрээс илүү бага боломжтой боломжтой мэдээлэл бидний 0-шууд Бид дараа нь хэлэлцүүлэх үр дүнг шинжилгээ хийж, зарим бүтцийг хэлэлцүүлэхэд ялангуяа хэлний шилжүүлэхэд зорилго үүсгэдэг.', 'mt': 'We explore cross-lingual transfer of register classification for web documents.  Registers, that is, text varieties such as blogs or news are one of the primary predictors of linguistic variation and thus affect the automatic processing of language.  Aħna nintroduċu żewġ korporazzjonijiet ġodda nnotati fir-reġistru, FreCORE u SweCORE, għall-Franċiż u l-Isvediż. We demonstrate that deep pre-trained language models perform strongly in these languages and outperform previous state-of-the-art in English and Finnish.  B’mod speċifiku, naraw 1) li trasferiment translingwistiku b’żero-shot mill-korpus Ingliż CORE kbir jista’ jaqbel jew jaqbeż mudelli monolingwistiċi ppubblikati qabel, u 2) li klassifikazzjoni monolingwistika ħafifa li teħtieġ ftit ħafna dejta ta’ taħriġ tista’ tilħaq jew taqbeż il-prestazzjoni ta’ żero-shot tagħna. We further analyse classification results finding that certain registers continue to pose challenges in particular for cross-lingual transfer.', 'pl': 'Badamy między językami transfer klasyfikacji rejestru dokumentów internetowych. Rejestry, czyli odmiany tekstowe, takie jak blogi czy wiadomości, są jednym z głównych predyktorów zmienności językowej i tym samym wpływają na automatyczne przetwarzanie języka. Wprowadzamy dwie nowe korpory z adnotacjami rejestrowymi, FreCORE i SweCORE, dla francuskiego i szwedzkiego. Pokazujemy, że głęboko przeszkolone modele językowe są silne w tych językach i przewyższają poprzednie najnowocześniejsze w języku angielskim i fińskim. W szczególności pokazujemy 1) że zero-shot cross-językowy transfer z dużego angielskiego korpusu CORE może pasować lub przewyższać wcześniej opublikowane modele jednojęzyczne, oraz 2) że lekka klasyfikacja jednojęzyczna wymagająca bardzo małej ilości danych treningowych może osiągnąć lub przewyższyć naszą wydajność zero-shot. Ponadto analizujemy wyniki klasyfikacji, stwierdzając, że niektóre rejestry nadal stanowią wyzwania w szczególności dla transferu między językami.', 'ro': 'Explorăm transferul translingv al clasificării registrelor pentru documentele web. Registrele, adică soiurile de text, cum ar fi blogurile sau știrile, sunt unul dintre principalii predictori ai variației lingvistice și afectează astfel procesarea automată a limbii. Introducem două noi corpore adnotate în registru, FreCORE și SweCORE, pentru franceză și suedeză. Demonstrăm că modelele lingvistice pre-instruite profunde performează puternic în aceste limbi și depășesc performanțele anterioare de ultimă oră în engleză și finlandeză. Mai exact, arătăm 1) că transferul translingvistic zero-shot din corpul CORE englez mare poate potrivi sau depăși modelele monolingve publicate anterior, și 2) că clasificarea monolingvă ușoară care necesită foarte puține date de antrenament poate atinge sau depăși performanța noastră zero-shot. Analizăm în continuare rezultatele clasificării constatând că anumite registre continuă să reprezinte provocări, în special în ceea ce privește transferul interlingv.', 'sr': 'Istražujemo cross-lingual transfer of register classification for web documents. Registeri, to je, raznolikosti teksta poput blogova ili vijesti, su jedan od glavnih predviđača jezičke varijacije i tako utiču na automatsku obradu jezika. Predstavljamo dve nove registrirane korporacije, FreCORE i SweCORE za francuski i švedski. Pokazujemo da duboko predobučeni jezički modeli napreduju snažno na ovim jezicima i izvršavaju prethodno stanje umjetnosti na engleskom i finskom jeziku. Posebno, pokazujemo 1) da nula-pogođena preko jezika prebacivanja iz velikog engleskog korpusa CORE može odgovarati ili preći ranije objavljene monojezičke modele, i 2) da lagana monojezička klasifikacija koja zahteva vrlo malo podataka o obuci može postići ili preći našu nulu pogođenju. Dalje analiziramo rezultate klasifikacije otkrivajući da određeni registri nastavljaju da izazove posebno za međujezički transfer.', 'so': 'Waxaannu baaraynaa wareejinta luuqadaha kala duwan ee diiwaangelinta ee warqadaha internetka. Isdiiwaangelinta waxaa ka mid ah kuwa ugu horeeya isbedelka luuqada, oo sidaas darteed waxay saameyn ku yeelanayaan baaritaanka rasmiga ah ee luuqada. Waxaan u soo bandhignaynaa laba shirkad oo cusub oo diiwaangelinta, FreCORE iyo SweCORE, Faraansiis iyo Iswidishka. Waxaynu muujinnaa in qaabab aad u dheer oo afka hore lagu tababaray ay ku sameeyaan luqadan aad iyo aad loona sameynayo xaaladda hore ee afka Ingiriiska iyo afka finnishka. Si gaar ah, waxaynu tusnaa 1) in warqadaha afka Ingiriiska oo badan laga soo wareejiyo noocyo kale oo noocyo ah uu ka dhigi karo ama uu soo dhaafi karo samooyinka horay loo soo daabacay muusikada afka muuqashada, iyo 2) in fasalka culus oo fudud oo culayska ah oo loo baahan yahay macluumaad waxbarasho oo aad u yar, uu gaadhi karo ama dhaafi karo muuqashada nooca ah. Waxyaabaha kaloo baaritaanka fasaxa ah waxaynu ka baahan nahay in diiwaangelinta qaarkood ay sii wadi lahaayeen dhibaatooyin gaar ah in lagu wareejiyo luuqadaha kala duwan.', 'si': 'අපි වෙබ් ලිපින්තුවන්ට ලිපින්තුරු වාර්තාව සඳහා භාෂාවික ප්\u200dරවර්තනය පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා. රිජිස්ටර්ස්, ඉතින්, බ්ලෝග් හා වාර්තාවක් වගේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් භාෂාවික වෙනස් වලගේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක අපි අළුත් රැජිස්ටර් දෙකක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් කර්පෝරා, FreCORE සහ SweCORE, ෆ්\u200dරෑන්ස් සහ ස්වීඩිෂ්. අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා මේ භාෂාවට ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු භාෂාවක් මොඩේල් වලින් බලයින් කරනවා වගේම ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ෆි විශේෂයෙන්, අපි 1) පෙන්වන්නේ, ලොකු ඉංග්\u200dරීසි CORE කොර්පුස් වලින් 0-shot cross-language Transfer ප්\u200dරවේශනය ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න පුළුවන් නැහැ නැහැ මුලින් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරලා ති අපි තවත් විශ්ලේෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂ කරනවා විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙ', 'sv': 'Vi undersöker gränsöverskridande överföring av registerklassificering för webbdokument. Register, det vill säga textvarianter som bloggar eller nyheter är en av de främsta prediktorerna för språklig variation och påverkar därmed den automatiska språkbehandlingen. Vi introducerar två nya registermärkta korpora, FreCORE och SweCORE, för franska och svenska. Vi visar att djuputbildade språkmodeller presterar starkt på dessa språk och överträffar tidigare toppmoderna på engelska och finska. Specifikt visar vi 1) att noll-skott tvärspråklig överföring från den stora engelska CORE-korpusen kan matcha eller överträffa tidigare publicerade enspråkiga modeller, och 2) att lätt enspråkig klassificering som kräver mycket lite träningsdata kan nå eller överträffa vår noll-skott prestanda. Vi analyserar vidare klassificeringsresultat och konstaterar att vissa register fortfarande utgör utmaningar, särskilt när det gäller överföring över språk.', 'ur': 'ہم ویب دکھانوں کے لئے راجستر کلاسپیٹ کی مختلف زبان کی ترافیس کا تحقیق کرتے ہیں. لکھنے والے، یعنی لکھنے والے مختلف، جیسے بلاگ یا خبریں، زبان اختلاف کی اصلی پیش بینی کرنے والوں میں سے ایک ہے اور اسی طرح زبان کی automatic processing پر اثر دیتے ہیں. ہم نے دو نئی راجستر کے ذریعہ مطلع کیا ہے، فرکور اور سوئکور، فرنس اور سوئدی کے لئے۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ان زبانوں میں عمیق طریقے کی زبان کی مدل مضبوط کر رہے ہیں اور ان سے پہلے انگلیسی اور فنلاندی میں اگلے طریقے کی موجود کررہے ہیں۔ ہم ایک کو دکھاتے ہیں کہ بڑے انگلیسی کور کی کورپوس سے zero-shot cross-lingual transfer can match or surpass previously published monolingual models, اور 2) that light weight monolingual classification requiring very small training data can reach or surpass our zero-shot performance. ہم اس کے بعد کلاسیفوں کا نتیجہ تحقیق کررہے ہیں کہ بعض رسیسٹر مخصوص زبان ترافیس کے لئے مشکلات بنا رہے ہیں۔', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் இணைய ஆவணங்களுக்கான பதிவு வகைப்படுத்தல் மொழியின் மாற்றுதலை தேடுகிறோம். பதிவகங்கள் என்னவென்றால், பதிவுகள் அல்லது செய்திகள் போன்ற உரை மாறுபடும் மொழியின் தானியங்கி செயல்படுத்தலை பாதிக்கும். நாம் இரண்டு புதிய பதிவேட்டு அறிவிக்கப்பட்ட நிறுவனத்தை அறிமுகப்படுத்துகிறோம், FreCORE மற்றும் ஸ்வீக்கோரி, பிரென் நாம் ஆழம் பயிற்சி முன் பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரிகள் இந்த மொழிகளில் கடுமையாக செயல்படுத்துகிறார்கள் என்பதை காட்டுகிறோம குறிப்பிட்ட 1) பெரிய ஆங்கிலத்திலிருந்து பூஜ்ஜிய மொழி மாற்றம் காட்டுகிறது முன்பு வெளியிடப்பட்ட மொத்த மாதிரிகளை பொருத்த அல்லது மேற்கொள்ள முடியும், மற்றும் 2) சிறிய நாம் மேலும் வகுப்பு முடிவுகளை ஆராய்ந்து கொள்கிறோம் சில பதிவுகள் குறிப்பிட்ட மொழி மாற்றுதலுக்கு சில சவா', 'uz': "Biz veb hujjatlari uchun bir necha tillar tarjimalarni o'rganamiz. Registratlar, blog yoki xabar kabi matnning turlari, lingvistik oʻzgarishning asosiy predictorlaridan biri, va shunday qilib tillarni avtomatik boshqarish imkoniyatini beradi. Biz ikkita yangi tashkilotni, FreCORE va SveCORE, Fransuz va Shvetsiya uchun ko'pchilikni anglatamiz. Biz o'rganishdan oldin o'rganilgan tillar modellari bu tillarda qiyin ishlaydi va oldingi ingliz va finnish tilida eng shaxsiy holatni bajaradi. Ko'rsatganda, biz 1'ni ko'rsamiz, katta ingliz CORE kompyuterdagi nuqta tilni o'zgartirish yoki avval o'zgartira olingan monolingual modellariga mos kelishi mumkin, va 2) bir nechta ta'lim maʼlumotimiz kerak boʻlgan oddiy munolingual darajasini o'zgartirish yoki nuqta suhbat natijasini o'zgartirish mumkin. Biz darajalashtirish natijalarini boshqa taʼminlovchi qilamiz, bir necha roʻyxatlar o'zgarishga tayyorlanmoqda.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi khám phá việc chuyển giao ngôn ngữ khác nhau cho các tài liệu web. Các ký giả, nghĩa là các loại chữ như blog hay tin tức là một trong những người dự đoán về ngôn ngữ, và do đó ảnh hưởng đến việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự động. Chúng tôi giới thiệu hai Hạ sĩ, FreCORE, và Thụy Sĩ mới, cho tiếng Pháp và Thụy Điển. Chúng tôi chứng minh rằng những mô hình ngôn ngữ dày đã được đào tạo hiệu quả mạnh mẽ trong những ngôn ngữ này và vượt trội trước đây trong tiếng Anh và Phần Lan. Đặc biệt, chúng tôi cho thấy 1) rằng việc chuyển qua ngôn ngữ không thành công từ tập đoàn Cortland tiếng Anh lớn có thể khớp hoặc vượt qua các mô hình độc ngôn ngữ đã được phát hành trước, và 2) rằng mức độ phân bổ nhỏ, cần rất ít dữ liệu đào tạo có thể đạt tới hoặc vượt qua hiệu suất bắn không của chúng tôi. Chúng tôi còn phân tích kết quả phân loại thêm, xác nhận rằng một số ngăn kéo tiếp tục thách thức, đặc biệt là chuyển qua ngôn ngữ.', 'hr': 'Istražujemo cross-lingual transfer of register classification for web documents. Registeri, to je, raznolikosti teksta poput blogova ili vijesti, jedan od glavnih predviđača jezičke varijacije i tako utječe na automatsku obradu jezika. Predstavljamo dvije nove registrirane korporacije, FreCORE i SweCORE za francuski i švedski. Pokazujemo da duboko predobučeni jezički modeli snažno izvode na ovim jezicima i nadmađuju prethodno stanje umjetnosti na engleskom i finskom jeziku. Posebno, pokazujemo 1) da se nula-pucnjava preko jezika prebacivanja iz velikog engleskog korpusa CORE može odgovarati ili prevazići prije objavljenih monojezičkih modela, i 2) da lagana monojezička klasifikacija koja zahtijeva vrlo malo podataka obuke može postići ili preći našu nulu-pucnjavu. Dalje analiziramo rezultate klasifikacije otkrivajući da određeni registri nastavljaju predstavljati izazove posebno za cross-lingual transfer.', 'da': 'Vi undersøger overførsel på tværs af sprog af registerklassificering for webdokumenter. Registrer, dvs. tekstsorter som blogs eller nyheder er en af de primære forudsigere for sproglig variation og påvirker dermed den automatiske sprogbehandling. Vi introducerer to nye registerannoterede korpora, FreCORE og SweCORE, til fransk og svensk. Vi demonstrerer, at dybe forududdannede sprogmodeller fungerer stærkt på disse sprog og overgår tidligere state-of-the-art på engelsk og finsk. Specielt viser vi 1) at nulsproget overførsel fra det store engelske CORE korpus kan matche eller overgå tidligere offentliggjorte ensprogede modeller, og 2) at letvægts ensproget klassificering, der kræver meget få træningsdata, kan nå eller overgå vores nulsprogede præstation. Vi analyserer yderligere klassifikationsresultater og konstaterer, at visse registre fortsat udgør udfordringer, især for overførsel på tværs af sprog.', 'bg': 'Проучваме междуезичното прехвърляне на класификация на регистрите за уеб документи. Регистрите, т.е. разновидности на текстове като блогове или новини, са един от основните предсказатели за лингвистичната вариация и по този начин засягат автоматичната обработка на езика. Представяме две нови корпорации с анотация на регистър, за френски и шведски език. Ние демонстрираме, че дълбоко подготвените езикови модели се представят силно на тези езици и превъзхождат предишните съвременни езикови модели на английски и финландски език. По-конкретно, ние показваме 1) че нулевият междуезичен трансфер от големия английски корпус може да съвпада или надминава публикуваните преди това моноезични модели, и 2) че леката моноезична класификация, изискваща много малко данни за тренировка, може да достигне или надмине нашата нулева производителност. Освен това анализираме резултатите от класификацията, като установим, че някои регистри продължават да поставят предизвикателства, по-специално за междуезичния трансфер.', 'nl': 'We onderzoeken de meertalige overdracht van registerclassificatie voor webdocumenten. Registers, dat wil zeggen, tekstvariëteiten zoals blogs of nieuws zijn een van de primaire voorspellers van taalvariatie en beïnvloeden dus de automatische verwerking van taal. We introduceren twee nieuwe register-annotated corpora, FreCORE en SweCORE, voor Frans en Zweeds. We tonen aan dat diepgetrainde taalmodellen sterk presteren in deze talen en beter presteren dan eerdere state-of-the-art in het Engels en Fins. Specifiek laten we zien 1) dat zero-shot cross-lingual transfer vanuit het grote Engelse CORE corpus kan overeenkomen met of overtreffen eerder gepubliceerde eentalige modellen, en 2) dat lichtgewicht eentalige classificatie die zeer weinig trainingsgegevens vereist, onze zero-shot prestaties kan bereiken of overtreffen. We analyseren verder de classificatieresultaten en constateren dat bepaalde registers nog steeds uitdagingen met zich meebrengen, met name voor de trans-linguale overdracht.', 'ko': '우리는 인터넷 문서의 언어 영역 분류의 다중 언어 이동을 탐구했다.어역, 즉 블로그나 뉴스 등 텍스트 변체는 언어 변이의 주요 예측 요소 중 하나이기 때문에 언어의 자동 처리에 영향을 미친다.우리는 프랑스어와 스웨덴어를 위해 두 개의 새로운 어역 표기 어료 라이브러리인 FreCORE와 SweCORE를 도입했다.우리는 깊이 있는 예훈련을 거친 언어 모델이 이 언어들 중에서 뛰어나고 영어와 핀란드어 방면에서 이전의 최신 수준보다 우수하다는 것을 증명했다.구체적으로 말하자면 1) 대형 영어 핵심 자료 라이브러리에서 나온 제로 렌즈 크로스 언어 이동은 이전에 발표된 단어 모델과 일치하거나 초과할 수 있다. 2) 훈련 데이터가 적은 경량급 단어 분류만으로도 우리의 제로 렌즈 성능을 달성하거나 초과할 수 있다.우리는 분류 결과를 한층 더 분석한 결과 일부 언어 영역이 다중 언어의 이동에 대한 도전이 계속되는 것을 발견했다.', 'fa': 'ما انتقال مختلف زبان\u200cهای مختلف محرمانه ثبت برای مدارک وب تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. ثبت\u200cنامه\u200cها، یعنی متفاوت\u200cهای متن مثل بلوگ\u200cها یا اخبار یکی از پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای اولیه تغییرات زبان\u200cنامه\u200cها هستند و به همین دلیل تحت تاثیر خود پردازش زبان می\u200cدهند. ما برای فرانسوی و سوئکور دو شرکت جدید با نامه ریزی جدید، فرکور و سوئکور را معرفی می کنیم. ما نشان می دهیم که مدلهای زبان پیش آموزش عمیق در این زبانها سخت انجام می دهند و از وضعیت پیشین هنر در انگلیسی و فنلاندی انجام می دهند. مخصوصاً ما ۱) نشان می دهیم که تغییر داده های کور انگلیسی بزرگ از مدل های تک زبانی که قبلاً منتشر شده\u200cاند می\u200cتواند با یا تغییر کند، و ۲) که تغییر داده های آموزش بسیار کوچک می\u200cتواند به اجرای صفر-شلیک ما رسید یا تغییر دهد. ما نتایج classification further analyzes results finding that certain registers continue to pose challenges in particular for cross-language transfer.', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen den sprachübergreifenden Transfer von Registerklassifikationen für Webdokumente. Register, d.h. Textsorten wie Blogs oder Nachrichten sind einer der primären Prädiktoren sprachlicher Variationen und beeinflussen damit die automatische Verarbeitung von Sprache. Wir stellen zwei neue Register-annotierte Korpora vor, FreCORE und SweCORE, für Französisch und Schwedisch. Wir zeigen, dass tief trainierte Sprachmodelle in diesen Sprachen stark abschneiden und bisherige State-of-the-Art in Englisch und Finnisch übertreffen. Konkret zeigen wir 1) dass Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual Transfer aus dem großen englischen CORE Korpus bereits veröffentlichten monolingualen Modellen entsprechen oder diese übertreffen kann, und 2) dass leichte monolinguale Klassifikationen, die sehr wenig Trainingsdaten erfordern, unsere Zero-Shot Leistung erreichen oder übertreffen können. Weiterhin analysieren wir Klassifizierungsergebnisse und stellen fest, dass bestimmte Register insbesondere für den sprachübergreifenden Transfer weiterhin Herausforderungen darstellen.', 'tr': 'Web senedleri üçin gadyr klasifikasynyň çoklu dillerden geçirişi keşfet. Diýmek ýaly bloglar ýa-da täzelikler ýaly metin çeşitlerinde dil üýtgewleriniň esasy taýýarlançylarynyň biridir we şonuň üçin dilini otomatik işlemegine täsirleýär. Biz Fransuz we Şweýsariýa üçin iki täze rejime ýazylan korpora, FreCORE we SweCORE bilen tanyşdyrýarys. Biz öňki öňki bilim taýýarlanan dilleriň nusgalarynyň bu dillerde gaty möhüm işleýändigini görkeýäris we öňki sanat taýýarlaryny iňlis we Finçe dilinde çykarmagyny görkeýäris. Adatça, biz 1) Iňlis CORE köpüsinden 0-atly çarpak dillerini öňünden täze bir dil nusgasyna gollaýar we üstüne geçebilir we 2) iň kiçiräk monolingüň klasifikasyny örän kiçi bilim maglumatymyza ulap biler ýa-da 0-atly netijesimizi aşyp biler. Daha da klasifikasyon netijesini çözümleýäs. Başka kitaplaryň belli kitaplaryň çarp diller geçirmesi üçin kynçylyklary diýip dowam etmäge dowam edýäris.', 'sw': 'Tunagundua uhamishaji wa lugha mbalimbali wa usambazaji wa uandikishaji kwa ajili ya nyaraka za mtandaoni. Registers, that is, text varieties such as blogs or news are one of the primary predictors of linguistic variation and thus affect the automatic processing of language.  Tunatambulisha kampuni mbili mpya ya kujiandikisha, FreCORE na SweCORE, kwa ajili ya Kifaransa na Kiswahili. Tunaonyesha kuwa mifano ya kina ya lugha zilizofunzwa kabla hufanya vizuri katika lugha hizi na kutengeneza hali ya sanaa iliyopita katika lugha ya Kiingereza na Kiingereza. Kwa hakika, tunaonyesha 1) kwamba usafirishaji wa lugha sifuri kutoka makampuni makubwa ya Uingereza wa CORE unaweza kupambana au kupitisha mifano ya lugha zilizochapishwa awali, na 2) kwamba usambazaji wa lugha yenye uzito unaohitaji takwimu ndogo za mafunzo yanaweza kufikia au kupitisha utendaji wetu wa picha sifuri. Tunafahamu matokeo mengine ya usambazaji yanagundua kuwa waandishi fulani wanaendelea kuwepo changamoto hasa kwa ajili ya uhamiaji wa lugha mbalimbali.', 'sq': 'Ne eksplorojmë transferimin ndërgjuhësor të klasifikimit të regjistrimit për dokumentet e internetit. Regjistrojnë, pra, varietetet e tekstit të tilla si bloget apo lajmet janë një nga parashikuesit kryesorë të variacionit gjuhësor dhe kështu ndikojnë në procesimin automatik të gjuhës. Ne prezantojmë dy korpra të reja të regjistruar, FreCORE dhe SweCORE, për francezët dhe suedezët. Ne demonstrojmë se modelet e gjuhës së thellë të paratrajnuar funksionojnë me forcë në këto gjuhë dhe bëjnë më tepër se gjendjen e mëparshme në anglisht dhe finlandez. Veçanërisht, ne tregojmë 1) se transferimi zero-shot ndërgjuhësor nga korpusi i madh anglez CORE mund të përputhet apo të kapërcejë modelet monogjuhësore publikuar më parë, dhe 2) se klasifikimi i lehtë monogjuhësor që kërkon shumë pak të dhëna trajnimi mund të arrijë apo të kapërcejë performancën tonë zero-shot. Ne analizojmë më tej rezultatet e klasifikimit duke gjetur se disa regjistra vazhdojnë të paraqesin sfida veçanërisht për transferimin ndërgjuhësor.', 'af': 'Ons ondersoek kruistale oordrag van register klasifikasie vir webdokumente. Registers, dit is, teks verskillighede soos blogs of nuus, is een van die primêre voorskouers van lingwisiese veranderinge en daarom het die outomatiese verwerking van taal invloek. Ons introduseer twee nuwe registreerde korpora, FreCORE en SweCORE vir Frans en Sweedse. Ons wys dat diep voorafgeleerde taal modele sterk in hierdie tale uitvoer en voorafgeleide staat-van-kuns in Engels en Finnish uitvoer. Spesifieke, ons wys 1) dat nul-skoot kruistale oordrag van die groot Engelske korpus kan ooreenstem of oordrag voorheen gepubliseer monolinglike modele, en 2) dat liggewig monolinglike klasifikasie wat baie klein onderwerp data benodig kan bereik of oordrag ons nul-skoot prestasie. Ons verder klassifikasie resultate analiseer en vind dat sekere registre voortgaan om uitdagings in besonderhede te stel vir kruistale oordrag.', 'am': 'የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ክፍተቶችን ለመረጃ ሰነዱን እንፈልጋለን፡፡ የቋንቋው መለያየት የመጀመሪያው የቋንቋ መለያየት የጽሑፍ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ተቃውሞ እና በቋንቋው ማቀናቀል ላይ የራሳቸውን ጉዳይ ያስቀምጣል፡፡ ለፈረንሳይና ስዊድንኛ ሁለት አዲስ የኢትዮጵያ ሪፖርት፣ ፍሪካ እና ስዊድኮሬን እናጠቃለን፡፡ ቀድሞ ተማሪዎች የቋንቋዎች ምሳሌዎች በዚህ ቋንቋዎች በብርቱ እንዲያደርጉ እናስታውቃለን፡፡ በተለይም 1) ከታላቁ ኢንግሊዝኛ ኮሬፕስ የክፍለ ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ መተላለፊያ ከአሁን በፊት የተዘጋጀውን በሞሎልቋል ሞላት ሊቃወም ወይም ማተላለፍ ይችላል፡፡ የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ለመቀናቀል የተለየ ጥያቄዎችን ለማግኘት እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'id': 'We explore cross-lingual transfer of register classification for web documents.  Registrasi, yaitu, variasi teks seperti blog atau berita adalah salah satu prediksor utama variasi bahasa dan sehingga mempengaruhi proses otomatis bahasa. Kami memperkenalkan dua korpora baru, FreCORE dan SweCORE, untuk Perancis dan Swedia. Kami menunjukkan bahwa model bahasa yang sudah dilatih mendalam berhasil dalam bahasa-bahasa ini dan melampaui batas kemajuan terdahulu dalam bahasa Inggris dan Finlandia. Secara spesifik, kita menunjukkan 1) bahwa transfer saling bahasa 0-shot dari CORE corpus Inggris besar dapat cocok atau melewati model monobahasa yang telah diterbitkan sebelumnya, dan 2) bahwa klasifikasi monobahasa ringan yang memerlukan data latihan sangat sedikit dapat mencapai atau melewati prestasi zero-shot kami. We further analyse classification results finding that certain registers continue to pose challenges in particular for cross-lingual transfer.', 'az': 'İnternet belgeleri üçün reģistr klasifikasiyasının çox dilli tərəfindən keşif edirik. Beləcə, bloglar və xəbərlər kimi mətn müxtəlifləri dillərin dəyişikliklərindən biridir və buna görə də dillərin otomatik işləməsini təsir edir. Biz Fransızca və İsveçə üçün iki yeni register-annotated corpora, FreCORE və SweCORE ilə tanışırıq. Biz dərin əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş dil modellərinin bu dillərdə çox möhkəm yapıldığını göstəririk və əvvəlki məlumatı İngilizə və Finlandiya dilində daha çox təhsil edirik. Özellikle, biz 1) böyük İngilis CORE korpusundan sıfır-fırlatılmış çox dilli tərəfindən keçmiş monodil modelləri ilə eşidə bilər və ya daha əvvəl tərəfindən tərəfindən keçə bilər, və 2) tərəfindən çox az tərəf verilən məlumatların bizim sıfır-fırlatılmış performansımızı çata bilər və Biz daha çox klasifikasiya sonuçlarını analiz edirik ki, bəzi səhifələr müəyyən edilmiş dillərin daşınması üçün çətinliklərə davam edirlər.', 'bs': 'Istražujemo cross-lingual transfer of register classification for web documents. Registeri, to je, raznolikosti teksta poput blogova ili vijesti, su jedan od glavnih predviđača jezičke varijacije i tako utjecaju na automatsku obradu jezika. Upoznajemo dvije nove registrirane korporacije, FreCORE i SweCORE za francuski i švedski. Pokazujemo da duboko predobučeni jezički modeli snažno izvode na ovim jezicima i nadmađuju prethodno stanje umjetnosti na engleskom i finskom jeziku. Posebno, pokazujemo 1) da nula-snimljena preko jezika prebacivanja iz velikog engleskog korpusa CORE može odgovarati ili prevazići ranije objavljene monojezičke modele, i 2) da lagana monojezička klasifikacija koja zahtijeva vrlo malo podataka o obuci može postići ili prevazići našu nula-snimku. Dalje analiziramo rezultate klasifikacije otkrivajući da određeni registri nastavljaju predstavljati izazove posebno za cross-lingual transfer.', 'hy': 'Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք վեբ-փաստաթղթերի ռեստորանների դասակարգման երկլեզվային փոխանցումը: Այսինքն, տեքստի բազմազանությունները, ինչպիսիք են բլոգերը կամ նորությունները, լեզվաբանական բազմազանության հիմնական կանխատեսողներից մեկն են, և դրանով ազդում են լեզվի ավտոմատիկ վերամշակման վրա: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք երկու նոր ֆրանսիացի և շվեդիացի համար արձակագրված կապորան, Ֆրեքոր և Շվեդիացի: We demonstrate that deep pre-trained language models perform strongly in these languages and outperform previous state-of-the-art in English and Finnish.  Հատկապես, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս 1) որ զրոյական լեզվի փոխանցումը մեծ անգլերենի CORECorpus-ից կարող է համապատասխանել կամ գերազանցել նախկինում հրատարակված միալեզվի մոդելները, և 2) որ թեթև միալեզվի դասակարգումը, որը պահանջում է շատ քիչ ուսուցման տվյալներ, կարող է հասնել կամ գերա Մենք նաև վերլուծում ենք դասակարգման արդյունքները, որոնք ցույց են տալիս, որ որոշ ռեստորներ շարունակում են առաջացնել մարտահրավեր, հատկապես լեզվի փոխանցման համար:', 'bn': 'আমরা ওয়েব নথিপত্রের জন্য রেজিস্টারের ক্লাসাফিকেশনের ক্রাস্ট্রান্সফারেশন অনুসন্ধান করি। রেজিস্টাররা যেমন ব্লগ অথবা সংবাদ বিভিন্ন পার্থক্য যেমন ভাষার ভিত্তিক ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্নের প্রথম ভবিষ্যদ্ব আমরা ফ্রেঞ্চ এবং সোয়েকোরের জন্য দুটি নতুন রেজিস্টারের কোর্পোরা, ফ্রেকোরি এবং সোয়েকরের সাথে পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি। আমরা প্রদর্শন করি যে প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার গভীর ভাষার মডেল এই ভাষায় শক্তিশালী করে এবং পূর্ববর্তী ইংরেজি ও ফিনিশ ভাষায় শিল্পের বিশেষ করে, আমরা ১ দেখাচ্ছি) যে বিশাল ইংরেজী কোর্পাস থেকে শূণ্যগুলো ক্রস-ভাষার স্থানান্তর করা যাবে বা পূর্বে প্রকাশিত মোনোলিভাল মডেলের সাথে মিলে অথবা অতিক্রম করতে পারে, আর ২) য আমরা আরো বিশ্লেষণ করি বিশ্লেষণের ফলাফল খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে কিছু নিবন্ধন চলতে থাকে বিশেষ করে বিশেষ করে ক্রিশ্চিন্ত ভাষাভা', 'fi': 'Tutkimme verkkoasiakirjojen rekisteriluokituksen monikielistä siirtoa. Rekisterit eli tekstilajikkeet, kuten blogit tai uutiset, ovat yksi tärkeimmistä kielellisen vaihtelun ennustajista ja vaikuttavat siten kielen automaattiseen käsittelyyn. Esittelemme kaksi uutta rekisterimerkinnällä varustettua korporaa, FreCORE ja SweCORE, ranskaksi ja ruotsiksi. Osoitamme, että syvällä koulutetut kielimallit suoriutuvat näillä kielillä vahvasti ja ylittävät aiemman huipputason englannin ja suomen kielessä. Osoitamme erityisesti 1) että englanninkielisestä CORE-korpusesta tuleva monikielinen siirto voi vastata tai ylittää aiemmin julkaistut yksikieliset mallit, ja 2) että kevyt yksikielinen luokitus, joka vaatii hyvin vähän harjoitustietoja, voi saavuttaa tai ylittää nollalaukauksen suorituskykymme. Lisäksi analysoimme luokittelutuloksia ja toteamme, että tietyt rekisterit asettavat edelleen haasteita erityisesti monikieliselle tiedonsiirrolle.', 'ca': "Exploram la transfer ència translingüística de la classificació del registre dels documents web. Els registres, és a dir, varietats de text com els blogs o les notícies són un dels principals preditors de la variació lingüística i afecten així el processament automàtic del llenguatge. Introduïm dos noves corpores anotats en registre, FreCORE i SweCORE, en francès i suec. Demonstrem que els models de llenguatges profundament pré-entrenats actuen fortament en aquestes llengües i superen l'actualitat anterior en anglès i finlandès. Specificament, demostram 1) que la transfer ència translingüística de fotografies zero del gran corpus anglès CORE pot coincidir o superar models monolingües publicats anteriorment, i 2) que la classificació monolingüística lleugera que requereix molt poca data d'entrenament pot arribar o superar el nostre rendiment de fotografies zero. Anàlisim més els resultats de la classificació descobrint que alguns registres segueixen plantejant reptes, en particular per a la transfer ència translingüística.", 'cs': 'Prozkoumáme mezi jazyky převod klasifikace registrů pro webové dokumenty. Registry, tj. textové odrůdy jako blogy nebo zprávy jsou jedním z primárních prediktorů jazykové variace a tím ovlivňují automatické zpracování jazyka. Představujeme dva nové registrované korpusy, FreCORE a SweCORE, pro francouzštinu a švédštinu. Dokazujeme, že hluboké předškolené jazykové modely v těchto jazycích výrazně fungují a překonávají předchozí nejmodernější jazyky v angličtině a finštině. Konkrétně ukazujeme 1) že nulový přenos křížových jazyků z velkého anglického korpusu CORE může odpovídat nebo překonat dříve publikované jednojjazyčné modely, a 2) že lehká jednojjazyčná klasifikace vyžadující velmi málo tréninkových dat může dosáhnout nebo překonat naši nulovou výkonnost. Dále analyzujeme výsledky klasifikace a zjišťujeme, že některé registry stále představují problémy zejména pro přenos mezi jazyky.', 'et': 'Uurime veebidokumentide registri klassifitseerimise keeltevahelist edastamist. Registrid ehk tekstisortid, näiteks blogid või uudised, on üks peamisi keelelise variatsiooni ennustajaid ja mõjutavad seega keele automaatset töötlemist. Tutvustame kahte uut registreeritud korporat, FreCORE ja SweCORE, prantsuse ja rootsi keeles. Näitame, et eelõpetatud keelemudelid toimivad neis keeltes tugevalt ning ületavad varasemaid tasemeid inglise ja soome keeles. Täpsemalt näitame, et 1) nullkeelse ülekande suurest inglise CORE korpusest võib vastada või ületada varem avaldatud ühekeelseid mudeleid, ja 2) et kerge ühekeelne klassifikatsioon, mis nõuab väga vähe treeninguandmeid, võib jõuda või ületada meie nullkeelse jõudluse. Lisaks analüüsime klassifitseerimistulemusi ja leiame, et teatud registrid kujutavad endast jätkuvalt probleeme eelkõige keeleülese ülekande puhul.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé énsesi pasar-sistem kanggo tekolakno nggawe layar kanggo dokumen web %1$s Awak dhéwé ngewehke durung tanggal sing dibutungano karo perusahaan, French lan Suwiti. Awak dhéwé éntukno ngono model sing luwih akeh banter, ingkang diangkat luwih dumateng lan ijol-ijolan sing kuwi tindang iki lan ijol-ijol-ijolan cara-ijol lan ijol-ijol. user profileSpanish Awak dhéwé éntuk njaluk kanggo ngerasakno dadi seneng pisan sing paling nggawe ngubah ujian kanggo nggawe tarjamahan kanggo nggawe luwih-luwih bantuan.', 'sk': 'Preučujemo medjezični prenos registrske klasifikacije spletnih dokumentov. Registri, torej besedilne vrste, kot so blogi ali novice, so eden od glavnih napovedovalcev jezikovne variacije in s tem vplivajo na avtomatsko obdelavo jezika. Predstavljamo dve novi korpusi, FreCORE in SweCORE, za francoščino in švedsko. Pokazujemo, da so globoko predhodno usposobljeni jezikovni modeli v teh jezikih močno uspešni in so boljši od prejšnjih najsodobnejših v angleščini in finščini. Natančneje, pokažemo 1) da se lahko ničelni medjezični prenos iz velikega angleškega korpusa CORE ujema ali presega prej objavljene enojezične modele in 2) da lahka enojezična klasifikacija, ki zahteva zelo malo podatkov o vadbi, doseže ali presega našo zmogljivost ničelnega strela. Nadalje analiziramo rezultate klasifikacije in ugotavljamo, da nekateri registri še naprej predstavljajo izzive zlasti pri medjezičnem prenosu.', 'ha': "Tuna jarraba transfer-daraja na'urar-linguin don takardar rajistare-rajistare. Registers, that is, text varieties such as blogs or news are one of the primary predictors of linguistic variation and thus affect the automatic processing of language.  Tuna sami makampuni biyu na rajistare-da-yanzu, FreCOR da SWeCOR, wa Faransiya da Iswidishki. Tuna nũna cewa misãlai masu da aka yi wa zaman tsari da harshen, su yi aiki mai ƙarfi a cikin wannan harshen kuma su taƙaita halin-da-gaba cikin Ingiriya da Finnish. Kayyai, Munã nuna 1) cewa transfer-nau'in-nau'in-nau'in-nau'i daga makampuni mai girma na Ingiriya, yana iya gamuwa da ko surge a gaba ɗaya da aka nuna misãlai na monoli-harshen, da 2) cewa, fassarar nau'i na nau'i na monoli'in da ake hitajiya da data masu ƙaranci ko kuma zai iya shafe aikin na sifori. Tuna ƙara bayãni ga fassarar fassarar fassarar da za'a gane cewa wasu mutane za'a ƙara su zama masu kansala, da haske wa shige-fassarar-harshen.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་དྲ་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་བྱེད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་གནས་འགུལ་འདྲ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཐོ་འགོད་བྱས་པ་དེའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་གེའི་སྣ་ཚོགས་དང་། བློག་འཕྲིན་དང་གསར་འགུལ་ནི་སྐད་རིགས ང་ཚོས་རྣམས་མཐོང་སྣང་མེད་པའི་ཟིན་བྲིས་སྐོར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ངོ་སྤྲོད་བྱེད། We demonstrate that deep pre-trained language models perform strongly in these languages and outperform previous state-of-the-art in English and Finnish. In particular, we show 1) that zero-shot cross-lingual transfer from the large English CORE corpus can match or surpass previously published monolingual models, and 2) that lightweight monolingual classification requiring very little training data can reach or surpass our zero-shot performance. ང་ཚོས་ཟིན་བྲིས་རྩིས་ཐོག་ལས་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ་ལས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཐབས་ཤེས་ཏེ།', 'he': 'We explore cross-lingual transfer of register classification for web documents.  Registers, that is, text varieties such as blogs or news are one of the primary predictors of linguistic variation and thus affect the automatic processing of language.  We introduce two new register-annotated corpora, FreCORE and SweCORE, for French and Swedish.  We demonstrate that deep pre-trained language models perform strongly in these languages and outperform previous state-of-the-art in English and Finnish.  Specifically, we show 1) that zero-shot cross-lingual transfer from the large English CORE corpus can match or surpass previously published monolingual models, and 2) that lightweight monolingual classification requiring very little training data can reach or surpass our zero-shot performance.  We further analyse classification results finding that certain registers continue to pose challenges in particular for cross-lingual transfer.'}
{'en': 'Why Find the Right One?', 'ar': 'لماذا تجد الشخص المناسب؟', 'es': '¿Por qué encontrar el correcto?', 'fr': 'Pourquoi trouver le bon\xa0?', 'pt': 'Por que encontrar o caminho certo?', 'ja': 'なぜ正しいものを見つけるのですか？', 'hi': 'सही एक क्यों खोजें?', 'ru': 'Зачем искать нужного?', 'zh': '何以得其宜?', 'ga': 'Cén Fáth Faigh an Ceann Ceart?', 'hu': 'Miért találja meg az igazit?', 'el': 'Γιατί να βρούμε το σωστό;', 'ka': 'ჱაღჲ ნამვპთქ ოპაგჲრჲ?', 'lt': 'Kodėl surasti teisingą?', 'it': 'Perché trovare quello giusto?', 'kk': 'Неге оң жағын табу?', 'mk': 'Зошто го најде вистинскиот?', 'ms': 'Kenapa cari yang betul?', 'ml': 'എന്തുകൊണ്ട് വലത് വലത് കണ്ടെത്തി?', 'mt': 'Għaliex Sib il-Ġusta?', 'mn': 'Яагаад баруун нэгийг олох вэ?', 'no': 'Hvorfor finn den høgre?', 'pl': 'Po co znaleźć właściwą?', 'ro': 'De ce să-l găseşti pe cel potrivit?', 'sr': 'Zašto nađeš pravog?', 'si': 'ඇයි හරි එක හොයාගන්නේ?', 'so': 'Maxaad u raadsatay midigta?', 'ta': 'ஏன் வலது ஒன்றை கண்டுபிடிக்க?', 'sv': 'Varför hitta den rätta?', 'ur': 'دائیں ایک کیوں پیدا کریں؟', 'uz': 'Nima uchun OĘ»ng tomonga qidirish?', 'vi': 'Sao lại tìm đúng người?', 'da': 'Hvorfor finde den rigtige?', 'hr': 'Zašto nađeš pravog?', 'de': 'Warum das Richtige finden?', 'bg': 'Защо да намерим правилния?', 'nl': 'Waarom de juiste vinden?', 'fa': 'چرا حق رو پيدا کردي؟', 'ko': '왜 옳은 사람을 찾아야 합니까?', 'id': 'Mengapa menemukan yang benar?', 'tr': 'Sagdany näme üçin tap?', 'sq': 'Pse të gjesh të djathtën?', 'am': 'ቀኝ ምን ፈልግ?', 'az': 'Nə üçün sağ olanı tap?', 'sw': 'Kwa nini kutafuta Haki?', 'af': 'Waarom vind die Regterkant Een?', 'bs': 'Zašto nađeš pravog?', 'hy': 'Why Find the Right One?', 'ca': 'Per què trobar el correcte?', 'cs': 'Proč najít tu správnou?', 'et': 'Miks leida õige?', 'fi': 'Miksi lĂ¶ytĂ¤Ă¤ oikea?', 'bn': 'ডান ওয়ান খুঁজে বের করো কেন?', 'sk': 'Zakaj najti pravega?', 'ha': 'Don me ka nẽmi dama?', 'jv': 'Laopo buk justificatin?', 'he': 'Why Find the Right One?', 'bo': 'ག་རེ་བྱས་ནས་གཡས་ཕྱོགས་གཅིག་རྙེད་པ།'}
{'en': 'The present paper investigates the impact of the anaphoric one words in English on the Neural Machine Translation (NMT) process using English-Hindi as source and target language pair. As expected, the experimental results show that the state-of-the-art Google English-Hindi NMT system achieves significantly poorly on sentences containing anaphoric ones as compared to the sentences containing regular, non-anaphoric ones. But, more importantly, we note that amongst the anaphoric words, the noun class is clearly much harder for NMT than the determinatives. This reaffirms the linguistic disparity of the two phenomenon in recent theoretical syntactic literature, despite the obvious surface similarities.', 'ar': 'تبحث هذه الورقة في تأثير الكلمات المفردة في اللغة الإنجليزية على عملية الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) باستخدام الإنجليزية-الهندية كمصدر وزوج لغوي مستهدف. كما هو متوقع ، أظهرت النتائج التجريبية أن نظام Google English-Indian NMT المتطور يحقق نجاحًا كبيرًا في الجمل التي تحتوي على جمل مبهمة مقارنة بالجمل التي تحتوي على جمل عادية غير مجسمة. ولكن ، الأهم من ذلك ، نلاحظ أنه من بين الكلمات الجذابة ، من الواضح أن فئة الاسم أصعب بكثير بالنسبة لـ NMT من المحددات. هذا يعيد تأكيد التباين اللغوي للظاهرتين في الأدبيات النحوية النظرية الحديثة ، على الرغم من أوجه التشابه السطحية الواضحة.', 'es': 'El presente artículo investiga el impacto de las palabras anafóricas en inglés en el proceso de traducción automática neuronal (NMT) utilizando el inglés-hindi como par de idiomas de origen y destino. Como era de esperar, los resultados experimentales muestran que el avanzado sistema Google English-Hindi NMT tiene un rendimiento significativamente deficiente en oraciones que contienen frases anafóricas en comparación con las oraciones que contienen frases normales y no anafóricas. Pero, lo que es más importante, observamos que entre las palabras anafóricas, la clase de sustantivos es claramente mucho más difícil para NMT que los determinantes. Esto reafirma la disparidad lingüística de los dos fenómenos en la literatura sintáctica teórica reciente, a pesar de las obvias similitudes superficiales.', 'fr': "Le présent article étudie l'impact du mot anaphorique en anglais sur le processus de traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) utilisant l'anglais-hindi comme paire de langues source et cible. Comme on pouvait s'y attendre, les résultats expérimentaux montrent que le système NMT anglais-hindi de Google obtient des résultats significativement médiocres sur les phrases contenant des phrases anaphoriques par rapport aux phrases contenant des phrases normales et non anaphoriques. Mais, plus important encore, nous notons que parmi les mots anaphoriques, la classe nominale est clairement beaucoup plus difficile pour NMT que pour les déterminants. Cela confirme la disparité linguistique des deux phénomènes dans la littérature syntaxique théorique récente, malgré les similitudes évidentes de surface.", 'pt': 'O presente artigo investiga o impacto das palavras anafóricas em inglês no processo de tradução automática neural (NMT) usando inglês-hindi como par de idiomas de origem e destino. Como esperado, os resultados experimentais mostram que o moderno sistema Google English-Hindi NMT tem um desempenho significativamente ruim em sentenças contendo anafóricas em comparação com sentenças contendo sentenças regulares e não anafóricas. Mas, mais importante, notamos que entre as palavras anafóricas, a classe nominal é claramente muito mais difícil para NMT do que os determinantes. Isso reafirma a disparidade linguística dos dois fenômenos na literatura sintática teórica recente, apesar das óbvias semelhanças superficiais.', 'ja': '本論文では、英語とヒンディー語を語源とする神経機械翻訳（ NMT ）プロセスに対する英語のアナフォリックな単語の影響を調査した。予想されるように、実験結果は、最先端のGoogle英語-ヒンディー語NMTシステムが、通常の、非比喩的な文章を含む文章と比較して、比喩的な文章を含む文章では大幅に不十分に達成することを示しています。しかし、もっと重要なことに、私たちは、比喩的な単語の中で、名詞クラスは明らかに決定論よりもNMTにとってはるかに難しいことに注目しています。これは、明らかな表面の類似性にもかかわらず、最近の理論的構文文献における2つの現象の言語的格差を再確認する。', 'zh': '本文治英语厌性一单词英语 - 印地语为言语神经机器翻译(NMT)。 如预期之实验结果表明,比于包含常非反义词之句,最先进之Google英语 - 印地语NMT系包厌叹词之句。 然要在反义词中,名词类于NMT,较确定性为难。 此再证近理句法文献语异,虽有明似。', 'hi': 'वर्तमान पेपर स्रोत और लक्ष्य भाषा जोड़ी के रूप में अंग्रेजी-हिंदी का उपयोग करके न्यूरल मशीन ट्रांसलेशन (एनएमटी) प्रक्रिया पर अंग्रेजी में एनाफोरिक एक शब्द के प्रभाव की जांच करता है। जैसा कि अपेक्षित था, प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि अत्याधुनिक Google अंग्रेजी-हिंदी NMT प्रणाली नियमित, गैर-एनाफोरिक वाले वाक्यों की तुलना में एनाफोरिक वाले वाक्यों पर काफी खराब तरीके से प्राप्त करती है। लेकिन, अधिक महत्वपूर्ण बात यह है कि हम ध्यान देते हैं कि एनाफोरिक शब्दों के बीच, संज्ञा वर्ग स्पष्ट रूप से NMT के लिए determinatives की तुलना में बहुत कठिन है। यह स्पष्ट सतह समानताओं के बावजूद हाल के सैद्धांतिक वाक्यात्मक साहित्य में दो घटनाओं की भाषाई असमानता की पुष्टि करता है।', 'ru': 'В настоящей работе исследуется влияние анафорических слов на английском языке на процесс нейронного машинного перевода (НМП) с использованием английского языка хинди в качестве исходной и целевой языковой пары. Как и ожидалось, экспериментальные результаты показывают, что самая современная система Google English-Hindi NMT значительно плохо достигает по предложениям, содержащим анафорические, по сравнению с предложениями, содержащими обычные, неанафорические. Но, что более важно, мы отмечаем, что среди анафорических слов класс существительных явно намного сложнее для НМТ, чем детерминанты. Это подтверждает лингвистическое неравенство двух явлений в недавней теоретической синтаксической литературе, несмотря на очевидное поверхностное сходство.', 'ga': 'Imscrúdaíonn an páipéar seo an tionchar a bhíonn ag an bhfocal anaifócach amháin i mBéarla ar phróiseas Neural Machine Translation (NMT) agus úsáid á baint as Béarla-Hiondúis mar phéire teanga agus foinse. Mar a bheifí ag súil leis, léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha go n-éiríonn go dona le córas úrscothach NMT Béarla-Hiondúis Google ar abairtí ina bhfuil abairtí anafóracha i gcomparáid leis na habairtí ina bhfuil abairtí rialta neamhanafóracha. Ach, níos tábhachtaí fós, tugaimid faoi deara i measc na bhfocal anafórach, gur léir go bhfuil an aicme ainmfhocail i bhfad níos deacra do NMT ná na cinntitheach. Athdhearbhaíonn sé seo difríocht teanga an dá fheiniméan sa litríocht chomhréire teoiriciúil le déanaí, in ainneoin na cosúlachtaí soiléire dromchla.', 'ka': 'მიმდინარე დომენტი ანაფორიკის ერთი სიტყვების შესახებ ინგლისური სიტყვების პროცესი ნეირალური მაქსინური გაგრძელება (NMT) პროცესის გამოყენება ინგლისური-ჰინ როგორც უნდა იქნება, ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენა, რომ Google ინგლისური-ინგლისური NMT სისტემა მნიშვნელოვანია ძალიან ცოტა წარმოდგენა წარმოდგენებით, რომლებიც ანაფორიური წარმოდგენების შემ მაგრამ უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ ანაფორიკური სიტყვების შორის, სიტყვების კლასი უფრო ძალიან რთულია NMT-ზე, ვიდრე განსაზღვრული სიტყვე ეს ახლა აღწერს ორი ფანომენის ლენდომისტიკური განსხვავება ახლა თეორეტიკური სინტაქტიკური ლიტერტურაში, მაგრამ აღწერებული სამყარო განსხვავება.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία διερευνά την επίδραση της αναφορικής μίας λέξης στα αγγλικά στη διαδικασία Νευρικής Μηχανικής Μετάφρασης (NMT) χρησιμοποιώντας Αγγλικά-Χίντι ως ζεύγος γλώσσας προέλευσης και στόχου. Όπως αναμενόταν, τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το υπερσύγχρονο σύστημα επιτυγχάνει σημαντικά χαμηλά σε προτάσεις που περιέχουν αναφορικές σε σύγκριση με τις προτάσεις που περιέχουν κανονικές, μη αναφορικές. Αλλά, το πιο σημαντικό, σημειώνουμε ότι μεταξύ των αναφορικών λέξεων, η τάξη ουσιαστικών είναι σαφώς πολύ πιο δύσκολη για το NMT από τα καθοριστικά. Αυτό επιβεβαιώνει την γλωσσική ανισότητα των δύο φαινομένων στην πρόσφατη θεωρητική συντακτική βιβλιογραφία, παρά τις προφανείς επιφανειακές ομοιότητες.', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmány az angol-hindi angol nyelvű anafórikus szó hatását vizsgálja a Neurális Gépi Fordítás (NMT) folyamatára. Mint várható, a kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a legkorszerűbb Google English-Hindi NMT rendszer jelentősen rosszul teljesít anafórikus mondatokat tartalmazó mondatok esetében, összehasonlítva a hagyományos, nem anafórikus mondatokat tartalmazó mondatokkal. De ami még fontosabb, megjegyezzük, hogy az anafórikus szavak között a főnévosztály nyilvánvalóan sokkal nehezebb az NMT számára, mint a meghatározók. Ez megerősíti a két jelenség nyelvi eltérését a közelmúltbeli elméleti szintaktikus irodalomban, a nyilvánvaló felületi hasonlóságok ellenére.', 'it': "Il presente articolo indaga l'impatto della sola parola anaforica in inglese sul processo Neural Machine Translation (NMT) utilizzando inglese-hindi come coppia di lingue di origine e di destinazione. Come previsto, i risultati sperimentali mostrano che lo stato dell'arte del sistema NMT Google English-Hindi raggiunge significativamente male le frasi contenenti quelle anaforiche rispetto alle frasi contenenti quelle regolari e non anaforiche. Ma, cosa più importante, notiamo che tra le parole anaforiche, la classe dei sostantivi è chiaramente molto più difficile per NMT rispetto ai determinanti. Ciò ribadisce la disparità linguistica dei due fenomeni nella recente letteratura sintattica teorica, nonostante le evidenti somiglianze superficiali.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente nagrinėjamas vieno anglų kalbos anaforinio žodžio poveikis neuroninių mašin ų vertimo (NMT) procesui, naudojant anglų ir hindų kaip šaltinio ir tikslinės kalbos poros. Kaip tikėtasi, eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad naujausia Google English-Hindi NMT sistema gerokai blogai pasiekia sakinius, kuriuose yra anaforinių, palyginti su sakiniais, kuriuose yra reguliarių, neaforinių. Tačiau svarbiau, mes pastebime, kad tarp anaforinių žodžių, pavadinimų klasė NMT akivaizdžiai yra daug sunkesnė nei lemiamieji. Tai dar kartą patvirtina šių dviejų reiškinių kalbinį skirtumą naujausioje teorinėje sintaktinėje literatūroje, nepaisant akivaizdžių paviršiaus panašumų.', 'mk': 'Сегашниот весник го истражува влијанието на анафоријата на еден збор на англиски на процесот на преведување на невралните машини (НМТ), користејќи англиско-хиндиски како пар на извор и мета јазик. Како што се очекува, експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека најсовремениот систем на Гугл англиско-хиндиско НМТ достигнува значително лошо на речениците кои содржат анафорски во споредба со речениците кои содржат регуларни, не анафорски. Но, што е поважно, забележуваме дека меѓу анафорските зборови, класата на именици е очигледно многу потешка за НМТ отколку за децентративните. Ова ја потврдува јазичната разлика на двата феномени во неодамнешната теоретска синтактичка литература, и покрај очигледните сличности на површината.', 'kk': 'Қазіргі қағаз ағылшын тілінде анафорикалық бір сөздің нәтижесін (NMT) ағылшын тілінің көзі мен мақсатты тілдер екі ретінде ағылшын тілінде қолдану процесіне зерттейді. Күтпеген тәжірибелі нәтижелер Google ағылшын-хинди NMT жүйесі анафорикалық сөйлемелерді қалыпты, анафорикалық емес сөйлемелерді салыстырып жатқан сөйлемелерде көп жақсы жеткізеді. Бірақ ең маңызды, анафориялық сөздердің арасында атаулық класы NMT үшін анықтамалық сөздерден көп қиын. Бұл жаңа теориялық синтактикалық лингвистикалық әдебиетінің лингвистикалық айырмашылығын қайта баптайды, бірақ таңдалған поверхностық ұқсас синтактикалық.', 'ml': 'ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ പത്രത്തിലുള്ള ഒരു വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ (NMT) പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്-ഹിന പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കുന്നത് പോലെ, പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് സാധാരണ ഗൂഗിള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്-ഹിന്ദി എംഎംടി സിസ്റ്റമാണ്. സാധാരണ, അനഫോരിക്ക് അല്ലാത്ത വാക്ക പക്ഷെ, അതിനെക്കാള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണ്, നമ്മള്\u200d കാണുന്നു, നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d നിര്\u200dണയിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കാള അടുത്ത തിയോറിക്കല്\u200d സിനോട്ടാക്റ്റിക്ക് സാഹിത്യത്തില്\u200d ഈ രണ്ടു സംഭവ്യത്തിന്റെ ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വ്യത്യാസ', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menyelidiki kesan satu perkataan anaforik dalam bahasa Inggeris pada proses Terjemahan Mesin Neural (NMT) menggunakan bahasa Inggeris-Hindi sebagai sumber dan pasangan bahasa sasaran. Seperti yang dijangka, hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa sistem NMT Google Inggeris-Hindi yang terbaik mencapai secara teruk pada kalimat yang mengandungi kalimat anafora dibandingkan dengan kalimat yang mengandungi kalimat biasa, bukan anafora. Tetapi, yang lebih penting, kita memperhatikan bahawa di antara perkataan anafora, kelas nama jelas lebih sukar untuk NMT daripada determinatif. Ini mengesahkan perbezaan bahasa dua fenomena dalam literatur sintaktik teori baru-baru ini, walaupun perbezaan permukaan yang jelas.', 'mt': 'Id-dokument preżenti jinvestiga l-impatt tal-kelma waħda anaforika bl-Ingliż fuq il-proċess tat-Traduzzjoni tal-Makkinarju Newrali (NMT) bl-użu tal-Ingliż-Indjan bħala pari tas-sors u tal-lingwa fil-mira. Kif mistenni, ir-riżultati sperimentali juru li s-sistema NMT Google English-Hindi l-aktar avvanzata tikseb b’mod sinifikanti ħażin fuq sentenzi li fihom sentenzi anaforiċi meta mqabbla mas-sentenzi li fihom sentenzi regolari, mhux anaforiċi. Iżda, aktar importanti, ninnota li fost il-kliem anaforiku, il-klassi tan-nomi hija ċarament ħafna aktar diffiċli għall-NMT mid-determinanti. Dan jafferma mill-ġdid id-disparità lingwistika taż-żewġ fenomeni fil-letteratura sintattika teoretika riċenti, minkejja s-similaritajiet ovvji tal-wiċċ.', 'mn': 'Харин одоогийн цаас Англи хэлний Англи хэлний нэг үгийн нөлөөг Англи хэлний мэдрэлийн машин хөгжүүлэх (NMT) процесс дээр Англи-Хинди хэлний эх үүсвэр болон зорилготой хэлний хоёр болгож ашиглаж байна. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд Google Англи-Хинди NMT системийн хувьд энафорик өгүүлбэрүүдийн харьцуулахад үнэхээр бага байдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Гэхдээ илүү чухал нь бид анефорийн үгнүүдийн дунд нэр хэлний хичээл NMT-д тодорхойлолтоос илүү хэцүү гэдгийг анзаарлаа. Энэ нь саяхан теоретикийн синтактикийн уран зохиолын хоёр явдалын хэлний ялгааг дахин баталдаг. Яг л тодорхой гадаргуу шиг харьцаагүй.', 'no': 'Dette noverande papiret undersøker effekten av anaforiske eitt ord på engelsk på prosessen Neuralmaskinsomsetjing (NMT) med engelsk-Hindi som kjeldespråk og målspråk. Som forventa, eksperimentelle resultaten viser at Google-kunstsystemet anglisk-Hindi NMT når setningane inneheld anaforiske som sammenlignet med setningane som inneheld regulære, ikkje-anaforiske. Men, mer viktig, merker vi at mellom anaforiske ord er det tydelig vanskeleg for NMT enn dei determinative. Dette bestemmer på nytt den langviske forskjellen av dei to fenomena i tidlegare teoretiske syntaktiske literatur, selv om det er tydelige overflateslikningane.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł bada wpływ anaforycznego jednego słowa w języku angielskim na proces neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego (NMT) z wykorzystaniem angielsko-hindi jako pary języków źródłowych i docelowych. Zgodnie z oczekiwaniami, wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że najnowocześniejszy system NMT Google English-Hindi osiąga znacznie słabo w przypadku zdań zawierających anaforyczne w porównaniu do zdań zawierających zwykłe, nieanaforyczne. Ale co ważniejsze, zauważamy, że wśród słów anaforycznych klasa rzeczownika jest wyraźnie trudniejsza dla NMT niż determinanty. Potwierdza to różnicę językową tych dwóch zjawisk w najnowszej teoretycznej literaturze składni, pomimo oczywistych powierzchniowych podobieństw.', 'ro': 'Lucrarea de față investighează impactul unui cuvânt anaforic în limba engleză asupra procesului Neural Machine Translation (NMT) folosind limba engleză-hindi ca pereche de limbi sursă și țintă. După cum era de așteptat, rezultatele experimentale arată că sistemul de ultimă generație Google English-Hindi NMT realizează semnificativ slab pe propoziții care conțin cele anaforice în comparație cu propozițiile care conțin cele regulate, non-anaforice. Dar, mai important, observăm că, printre cuvintele anaforice, clasa substantivelor este clar mult mai grea pentru NMT decât determinatorii. Acest lucru reafirmă disparitatea lingvistică a celor două fenomene în literatura sintactică teoretică recentă, în ciuda identităților evidente de suprafață.', 'so': "Warqadda joogtada ah waxyaabaha uu ku saabsan yahay afka Ingiriiska ku qoran ku saabsan tarjumidda Masiinka Neural (NMT) ee uu Ingiriis-Hindi u isticmaalayo noocyo iyo labo luqad ah. Wixii la rajaynayo waxaa muuqda arimaha imtixaanka ah in xaaladda farshaxanka ah ee Google-Ingiriis-Hindi NMT uu si aad u baahan u helaa erayo ku qoran sawir ah oo la barbarbardhiga hadallada ku qoran qoraalka caadiga ah ee aan caadiga aheyn. Laakiin si muhiimka ah, waxaynu ogaannaa in fasalka nooca ee NMT ay ugu adag tahay in ka sii adag yihiin go'aanka. Tani waxay dib u dhigtaa kala duwanaanshaha luqada labada waxyaalood ee la soo dhowaaday qoraalka saynetiga, inkastoo ay muuqato sida muuqata ah.", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats undersöker effekten av det anaforiska ordet på engelska på Neural Machine Translation (NMT) processen med hjälp av engelsk-hindi som källa- och målspråkspar. Som förväntat visar de experimentella resultaten att det toppmoderna Google English-Hindi NMT-systemet uppnår signifikant dåligt på meningar som innehåller anaforiska jämfört med meningar som innehåller vanliga, icke-anaforiska meningar. Men, ännu viktigare, vi noterar att bland de anaforiska orden, substantivklassen är klart mycket svårare för NMT än determinativen. Detta bekräftar den språkliga skillnaderna mellan de två fenomenen i den senaste teoretiska syntaktiska litteraturen, trots de uppenbara ytlikheterna.', 'si': 'මුළින් පැත්තේ ඉංග්\u200dරීසියේ අනාෆෝරික් එක වචන වගේ පරීක්ෂණය පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා ඇන්ග්\u200dරීසියේ න්\u200dයුරල් මේෂින් භාවිත බලාපොරොත්තු විදිහට, පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර ඒත්, වැදගත් වැදගත්, අපි දැනගන්නවා අනාෆෝරික් වචන් අතර, නම් ප්\u200dරශ්ණය NMT විශ්වාසයෙන් විශ්වාස කරන්නේ නිර්දේ මේක නැවත විශ්වාස කරනවා අලුත් සිද්ධාත්මක සංවේදනයේ භාෂාත්මක වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන්, පැහැදිලි පුළුවන් වගේ සාමා', 'sr': 'U sadašnjem papiru istražuje utjecaj anaforske jedne reči na engleski jezik na proces Neuralne mašine prevode (NMT) koristeći engleski hindi kao izvor i ciljni jezički par. Kao što je očekivano, eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da sistem Google engleski-Hindi NMT-a dostiže značajno loše rečenice koje sadrže anaforske rečenice u usporedbi sa rečenicama koja sadrže obične, ne-anaforske rečenice. Ali, važnije, primećujemo da je između anaforičkih reèi klasa imena jasno mnogo teža za NMT od determinativa. To potvrđuje jezičku razliku dva fenomena u nedavnoj teorijskoj sintaktičkoj literaturi, uprkos očiglednim sličnostima površine.', 'ur': 'اوسنی کاغذ انگلیسی میں انگلیسی میں ایک لغات کا اثر انگلیسی کے ذریعے انگلیسی-ہندی کے ذریعے استعمال کرتا ہے۔ جس طرح انتظار کی گئی ہے، آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ گوگل انگلیسی-ہندی NMT سیسٹم نے انگلیسی-انگلیسی-ہندی سیسٹم کے مطابق انگلیسی باتوں کے بارے میں بہت کم پانے لگتے ہیں جیسے کلمات کے مطابق معمولی، غیر انفا لیکن بہت اہم باتیں یاد کرتے ہیں کہ نام کلاس NMT کے لئے مقررہ باتوں سے زیادہ مشکل ہے۔ یہ دوبارہ تفصیل کرتا ہے کہ ان دونوں فناوروں کی زبان اختلاف اچھی تئوریٹی سینٹیکٹی ادبیات میں ہے، صریح سطح مثالی کے بغیر.', 'ta': 'தற்போதைய காகிதம் ஆங்கிலத்தில் ஒரு வார்த்தைகளின் தாக்கத்தைத் தேடுகிறது நெயுரால் இயந்திரத் மொழிமாற்றி (NMT) செயல்பாடு ஆங்கிலத்தி எதிர்பார்க்கப்படும் போது, சோதனை முடிவு ஆனால், முக்கியமாக, நாம் கவனிக்க வேண்டும் என்றால், நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட வார்த்தைகளில், நாம் நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம் என்றால், நா இது சமீபத்தில் திசீரியல் ஒத்திசைவு நிகழ்வில் இரண்டு பொருள்களின் மொழியில் பிரிவினையை மீண்டும் உறுதிப்படுத்துகிறது, வெளிப்படை', 'uz': "Name Tasavvur qilayotganda, tajriba natijalari Google-english-Hindi NMT tizimning holatida anaforik bir so'zlari bilan o'xshash, oddiy anaforik yo'z so'zlariga ega so'zlarda juda juda juda yomon. Lekin, muhim, biz anafotik so'zlarida, bu sinfning o'zgarishlaridan juda qiyin edi. Yaqinda tashqi teoretikal syntactik litteratoridagi ikkita holatning tillarini qayta ishlatadi. Ko'rining ko'payligi ham ham.", 'vi': 'Bài báo hiện nay nghiên cứu tác động của phép lạ một từ bằng tiếng Anh lên quá trình dịch chuyển máy thần kinh (NMB) sử dụng tiếng Anh-Hindi làm nguồn và cặp ngôn ngữ đích. Theo dự kiến, kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy hệ thống NMT Anh-Hindi đến thời đại nghệ thuật đạt đến một mức thấp ở các câu có chứa gốc không cố định so với câu có câu thường, không phải phép lạ. Nhưng, quan trọng hơn, chúng ta nhận ra rằng trong ngôn ngữ không phoric, lớp danh từ rõ ràng là khó hơn cho NMT nhiều là những phần quyết định. Điều này khẳng định sự khác biệt ngôn ngữ của hai hiện tượng trong văn học pháp thuật lý gần đây, bất chấp những bề mặt tương đồng rõ ràng.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия изследва въздействието на анафоричните еднодуми на английски език върху процеса на неврален машинен превод (НМТ), използвайки английско-хинди като изходна и целева езикова двойка. Както се очаква, експерименталните резултати показват, че най-съвременната система постига значително слабо изречения, съдържащи анафорични, в сравнение с изреченията, съдържащи редовни, неанафорични. Но, по-важното, отбелязваме, че сред анафоричните думи, класът на съществителното очевидно е много по-труден за НМТ, отколкото определящите. Това потвърждава езиковото несъответствие на двата феномена в последната теоретична синтактична литература, въпреки очевидните повърхностни прилики.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel onderzoekt de impact van het anaforische één woord in het Engels op het Neural Machine Translation (NMT) proces met behulp van Engels-Hindi als bron- en doeltaalpaar. Zoals verwacht, tonen de experimentele resultaten aan dat het state-of-the-art Google Engels-Hindi NMT systeem significant slecht presteert op zinnen die anaforische bevatten in vergelijking met zinnen die gewone, niet-anaforische zinnen bevatten. Maar, belangrijker, we merken op dat onder de anaforische woorden, de zelfstandige naamwoord klasse duidelijk veel moeilijker is voor NMT dan de determinatieven. Dit bevestigt opnieuw de taalkundige ongelijkheid van de twee verschijnselen in de recente theoretische syntactische literatuur, ondanks de duidelijke oppervlakteovereenkomsten.', 'da': 'Denne artikel undersøger effekten af det anaforiske ét ord på engelsk på Neural Machine Translation (NMT) processen ved at bruge engelsk-hindi som kilde- og målsprog par. Som forventet viser de eksperimentelle resultater, at det avancerede Google engelsk-hindi NMT-system opnår betydeligt dårligt på sætninger, der indeholder anaforiske, sammenlignet med sætninger, der indeholder almindelige, ikke-anaforiske. Men endnu vigtigere bemærker vi, at blandt de anaforiske ord er substantivklassen tydeligvis meget sværere for NMT end bestemmende elementer. Dette bekræfter den sproglige forskel mellem de to fænomener i den seneste teoretiske syntaktiske litteratur på trods af de åbenlyse overflade ligheder.', 'de': 'Die vorliegende Arbeit untersucht den Einfluss des anaphorischen Ein-Wortes auf den neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzungsprozess (NMT) unter Verwendung von Englisch-Hindi als Ausgangs- und Zielsprachenpaar. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen erwartungsgemäß, dass das hochmoderne Google English-Hindi NMT-System bei anaphorischen Sätzen im Vergleich zu regulären, nicht anaphorischen Sätzen deutlich schlechter abschneidet. Aber noch wichtiger ist, dass wir feststellen, dass unter den anaphorischen Wörtern die Substantivklasse für NMT deutlich schwieriger ist als die Determinanten. Dies bestätigt die sprachliche Disparität der beiden Phänomene in der neueren theoretischen syntaktischen Literatur, trotz der offensichtlichen oberflächlichen Ähnlichkeiten.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menyelidiki dampak dari satu kata anafora dalam bahasa Inggris pada proses Translation Machine Neural (NMT) menggunakan bahasa Inggris-Hindi sebagai sumber dan pasangan bahasa sasaran. As expected, the experimental results show that the state-of-the-art Google English-Hindi NMT system achieves significantly poorly on sentences containing anaphoric ones as compared to the sentences containing regular, non-anaphoric ones.  Namun, yang lebih penting, kita memperhatikan bahwa di antara kata-kata anafora, kelas nama jelas jauh lebih sulit untuk NMT daripada determinatif. Hal ini mengesahkan perbedaan bahasa dua fenomena dalam literatur sintaksi teori baru-baru ini, meskipun perbedaan permukaan yang jelas.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ در حال حاضر تاثیر انفوریک یک کلمه در انگلیسی بر فرایند ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) با استفاده از انگلیسی-هندی به عنوان جفت زبان منبع و هدف تحقیق می\u200cکند. همانطور که انتظار داشته باشید، نتیجه آزمایشی نشان می دهد که سیستم انگلیسی هندی NMT در حالت هندی انگلیسی و هندی با جمله های آنفوریک در مقایسه با جمله های معمولی غیر آنفوریک به شدت بد رسیده است. اما مهمتر است که ما یاد می\u200cگیریم که در میان کلمات نافوریک کلاس نام برای NMT خیلی سخت\u200cتر از تصمیم\u200cگیری است. این تفاوت زبان\u200cشناسی دو پدیده در ادبیات سنتاکتیک نظریه اخیر، با وجود شبیه\u200cهای سطح\u200cشناسی مشخص می\u200cشود.', 'ko': '본고는 영어 인디언을 원어와 목표어로 삼아 영어에서 반지 단어가 신경기계번역(NMT) 과정에 미치는 영향을 연구하고자 한다.예상한 바와 같이, 실험 결과, 가장 선진적인 Google-English-Hindi NMT 시스템은 반지어가 포함된 문장에서 일반적인 비반지어가 포함된 문장보다 현저히 낮게 나타났다.그러나 더 중요한 것은 반지어에서 명사류는 분명히 한정어보다 NMT를 진행하기 어렵다는 것을 알아차렸다는 것이다.이것은 표면적으로 뚜렷한 유사점이 있지만 이 두 가지 현상이 최근의 이론 문법 문헌에서 언어 차이를 다시 한 번 증명했다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti la sasa linachunguza athari ya maneno moja kwa lugha ya Kiingereza juu ya utafsiri wa Mashine ya Neural (NMT) kwa kutumia Kiingereza-Hindi kama chanzo na kwa lengo la lugha. Kama ilivyotarajiwa, matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba mfumo wa aina ya sanaa wa Google Kiingereza-Hindi NMT unafanikiwa vibaya sana juu ya hukumu zinazohusu maneno yanayofanana na hukumu zinazohusu mara kwa mara, zisizo za kawaida. Lakini, kwa umuhimu zaidi, tunagundua kuwa miongoni mwa maneno ya utambulisho, darasa la kutosha ni vigumu sana kwa NMT kuliko maamuzi. Hii inasisitiza tofauti ya lugha hizo mbili katika fasihi ya kidini ya hivi karibuni, licha ya hali ya wazi inayofanana.', 'tr': 'Häzirki kagyz iňlisçe Neural Maşynyň terjimesine (NMT) Iňlisçe-Hindileri çeşme we maksadyň çift bolup işleýän anaforik sözleriniň täsirini barlaýar. Görülen ýaly, synaglama netijeleri Google iňlis-Hindi NMT sistemasynda düzgün, anaforik däldir sözleriň içinde anaforik sözleriň ýagdaýynda deňil ýetip bilýär. Fakat daha önemlisi, anaforik kelimelerin arasında, isim klası NMT için determinativlerinden çok daha zor olduğunu söylüyoruz. Bu ýaňky teoriýa sintaktik edebiýatynda iki fenomeniň lingwistiki tapawutlygyny täzeden boşluýar.', 'sq': 'Gazeta e tanishme heton ndikimin e një fjale anaforike në anglisht në procesin e Translacionit të Makinës Neurale (NMT) duke përdorur anglisht-Hindi si një çift burimi dhe gjuhës objektiv. Siç pritet, rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se sistemi i Google English-Hindi NMT arrin ndjeshëm keq në fjalët që përmbajnë ato anaforike krahasuar me fjalët që përmbajnë ato të rregullta, jo anaforike. Por, më e rëndësishme, ne vëmë në dukje se mes fjalëve anaforike, klasa e emrave është qartë shumë më e vështirë për NMT sesa përcaktuesit. Kjo përsërit dallimin gjuhësor të dy fenomeneve në literaturën e fundit teorike sintaktike, pavarësisht nga ngjashmëritë e dukshme të sipërfaqes.', 'hr': 'U sadašnjem papiru istražuje učinak anaforske jedne riječi na engleskom jeziku na proces neurološkog prevoda strojeva (NMT) koristeći engleski hindi kao izvor i ciljni jezički par. Kao što je očekivano, eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da sustav umjetnosti Google engleskog-Hindi NMT-a dostiže značajno loše na rečenicama koja sadrže anaforske rečenice u usporedbi s rečenicama koja sadrže obične, ne-anaforske rečenice. Ali, važnije je, primjećujemo da je između anaforskih riječi, imenovna klasa očigledno mnogo teža za NMT od odlučivanja. To potvrđuje jezičku razliku dva fenomena u nedavnoj teorijskoj sintaktičkoj literaturi, uprkos očiglednim sličnostima površine.', 'af': 'Die huidige papier ondersoek die effek van die anafories een woorde in Engels op die Neurale Masjien Vertaling (NMT) proses wat Engels-Hindi gebruik as bron en doel taal paar. Soos verwagte, vertoon die eksperimentale resultate dat die staat van die kunste Google Engels-Hindi NMT stelsel betekenlik verkeerd bereik word op setinge wat anafories bevat soos vergelyk met die setinge wat gewone, nie-anafories bevat. Maar, meer belangrik, ons nota dat onder die anaforiese woorde, die nouklas is duidelik baie harder vir NMT as die determinatiewe. Hierdie bevestig die lingwisiese verskil van die twee fenomen in onlangse teorieese sintaktiske literateit, ten ag van die oorspronklike oorspronklike oorspronklikheid.', 'am': 'የአሁኑ ገጾች በንግግሊዝኛ አንድን ቃላት በኔural Machine ትርጉም (NMT) ፕሮጀክት የኢንጂልኛ-Hindi እንደ ምንጭ እና የቋንቋ ሁለትን በመጠቀም የሚቃወሙትን ጉዳይ ይፈልጋል፡፡ እንደተስፋ፣ የፈተናው ውጤቶች የጉግል-የኢንጂል-የኢንጂል-የኪንዲ NMT ሥርዓት ግንኙነት በተቃራኒ እናንፎክራዊ ተቃዋሚዎች በተደረገ ጽሑፎች ላይ እጅግ ችግር እንዲያገኝ ያሳያል፡፡ But, more importantly, we note that amongst the anaphoric words, the noun class is clearly much harder for NMT than the determinatives.  ይህ የቋንቋው ተቃውሞ፣ በግልጽ ብጤት ምንም እንኳ በሁለቱ የtheoretical Syntactic literature የቋንቋው መለያየት አረጋገጠ፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթին ուսումնասիրում է անգլերենում մեկ բառի ազդեցությունը նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) գործընթացի վրա, օգտագործելով անգլերեն-հնդիկ որպես աղբյուր և նպատակային լեզու զույգ: Ինչպես ակնկալում էր, փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ Google-ի ամենաբարձր անգլերեն-հնդիկ NMT համակարգը նշանակալի վատ է հասնում նախադասությունների վրա, որոնք պարունակում են անաֆորիկ նախադասություններ, համեմատած նախադասությունների վրա, որոնք պարունակում են Բայց ամենակարևորը, մենք նկատում ենք, որ անաֆորական բառերի մեջ, անվանումների դասը բացահայտորեն շատ ավելի դժվար է NMT-ի համար, քան որոշող նյութերը: Սա կրկին հաստատում է երկու երևույթի լեզվաբանական անհավասարությունը վերջին տեսական սինտակտիկ գրականության մեջ, չնայած մակերեսի ակնհայտ նմանություններին:', 'bs': 'U sadašnjem papiru istražuje učinak anaforske jedne riječi na engleskom jeziku na proces neurološkog prevoda mašine (NMT) koristeći engleski hindi kao izvor i ciljni jezički par. Kao što je očekivano, eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da sistem Google engleski-Hindi NMT-a dostigne značajno loše rečenice koje sadrže anaforske rečenice u usporedbi sa rečenicama koja sadrže obične, ne-anaforske rečenice. Ali, važnije, primjećujemo da je između anaforičkih riječi, klasa imena očigledno mnogo teža za NMT od determinativa. To potvrđuje jezičku razliku dva fenomena u nedavnoj teorijskoj sintaktičkoj literaturi, uprkos očiglednim sličnostima površine.', 'bn': 'বর্তমান পত্রিকাটি ইংরেজি ভাষায় একটি শব্দের প্রভাব তদন্ত করেছে যা ইংরেজী হিন্দি ব্যবহার করে সোর্স এবং লক্ষ্য ভাষার জোড়া হিসেবে গ্রহণ করেছে। যেমন আশা করা হয়েছে, পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে গুগল-শিল্পী ইংরেজী হিন্দি এনএমটি সিস্টেমের রাষ্ট্রের বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিষয় কিন্তু আরো গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, আমরা লক্ষ্য করি যে বিভিন্ন শব্দের মধ্যে নির্ধারিত ক্লাসের চেয়ে বেশি কঠিন। সাম্প্রতিক তত্ত্বিক সাহিত্যে এই দুটি বৈষম্যের ভাষার বৈচিত্র্য পুনরায় প্রতিষ্ঠা করে, যদিও স্পষ্ট প্রাক্ষাপটের একই রকম।', 'ca': "El presente article investiga l'impacte de l'anafòrica una paraula en anglès en el procés de traducció neuronal de màquina (NMT) utilitzant anglès-hindí com a parell de llenguatges d'origen i alvo. Com s'esperava, els resultats experimentals mostren que el sistema NMT Google anglès-hindí d'última generació aconsegueix significativament malament les frases que contenen anafòriques en comparació amb les que contenen frases regulars i no anafòriques. Però, més important, observem que entre les paraules anafòriques, la classe de noms és clarament molt més difícil per a la NMT que els determinants. Això reafirma la disparitat lingüística dels dos fenomens en la literatura teòrica sinàctica recent, malgrat les aparències de superfície.", 'cs': 'Příspěvek zkoumá vliv anaforického jednoho slova v angličtině na proces neuronového strojového překladu (NMT) s využitím anglicko-hindštiny jako zdrojového a cílového jazykového páru. Jak se očekává, experimentální výsledky ukazují, že nejmodernější systém Google English-Hindi NMT dosahuje výrazně špatně u vět obsahujících anaforické věty ve srovnání s větami obsahujícími běžné, ne-anaforické. Ale co je důležitější, poznamenáváme, že mezi anaforickými slovy je třída podstatného jména pro NMT jasně mnohem těžší než determinativa. To znovu potvrzuje jazykovou rozdílnost obou fenoménů v nedávné teoretické syntaktické literatuře, navzdory zřejmým povrchovým podobnostem.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös uuritakse ingliskeelse anafoorse ühesõna mõju neuromasintõlke protsessile, kasutades inglise-hindi lähte- ja sihtkeelepaarina. Nagu oodatud, näitavad eksperimentaalsed tulemused, et Google English-Hindi NMT süsteem saavutab oluliselt halvasti anafoorseid lauseid sisaldavate lausetega võrreldes tavalisi, mitteafoorseid lauseid sisaldavate lausetega. Aga mis veelgi tähtsam, me märgime, et anafoorsete sõnade hulgas on substantiivklass NMT jaoks ilmselgelt palju raskem kui determinatiivid. See kinnitab kahe nähtuse keelelist erinevust hiljutises teoreetilises süntaktilises kirjanduses, vaatamata ilmsele pinnasarnasusele.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä tutkitaan englanninkielisen anaforisen yhden sanan vaikutusta neurokäännösprosessiin käyttäen englannin ja hindin lähdekieliparina. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat odotetusti, että uusin Google English-Hindi NMT-järjestelmä saavuttaa huomattavasti heikosti anaforisia lauseita sisältävissä lauseissa verrattuna tavallisia, ei-anaforisia lauseita sisältäviin lauseisiin. Mutta mikä tärkeintä, huomaamme, että anaforisten sanojen joukossa substantiivinen luokka on selvästi paljon vaikeampi NMT:lle kuin määrittävät aineet. Tämä vahvistaa näiden kahden ilmiön kielellisen eron viimeaikaisessa teoreettisessa syntaktisessa kirjallisuudessa ilmeisistä pintapuolisista samankaltaisuuksista huolimatta.', 'az': 'Şimdiki kağıt anaforik bir sözlərin nöral Makin Çeviri (NMT) ilə İngilizə-Hindi dili çifti olaraq istifadə edərək anaforik təsirlərinin təsirini incidir. Gördüyünüz kimi, təcrübə sonuçları Google İngilis-Hindi NMT sisteminin düzgün, anaforik olmayan cümlələrlə qarşılaşdığı cümlələrdə anaforik olan cümlələr barəsində çox pis fikirləşir. Amma daha önemli, anaforik sözlərin arasında NMT üçün qərarlıqlarından daha çətindir. Bu, yenidən teoriki sintaktik qismətində olan iki fenomenin dil müxtəlifliyini təsdiqləyir, açıq-aydın yüzə bənzərinə baxmayaraq.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggunakake kapan pangan karo anaphoriki sing saben kelas nang Inggris neng Tarjamahan NMT Sugeng awak dhéwé, dadi sing paling-uwong ngomong nik sistem sing gak-kalem Google Inggris-hini NMT kuwi nggawe barang akeh luwih apik kanggo ngerasakno sing nganggo perusahaan Anaforik nang ngerasakno gambar deweke nggo ngerasakno ujaran, ora awak-anaphor. Nanging, akeh luwih luwih-luwih apik, kéné ngerti ngerasakno ngono kelas anaphoriki, klas bantuan kuwi susahe kanggo NMT luwih apik dhéwé Ngomongke bener nggawe kaé kelanganan ingkang sampeyan éwé nang ngerasakno sing luwih dumadhi, nganggo perbudhakan kuwi durung.', 'ha': "Gansa da aka yanzu, yana ƙidãya matsayin ayukan na anaforic cikin Ingiriya a kan Translate na Kijeriya na Neural (NMT) ta yi amfani da Ingiriya-Hindi kamar nau'in da aka ƙayyade nau'i biyu. Kama da ake ƙayyade, matsalan ta nuna cewa halin-mai-kunyar Google-Ingiriya-Hindu NMT ya sãmu mai girma a kan maganar da ke ƙunsa da masu anaforiki kamar da aka sammeni da maganar da ke ƙunsa da wasu na'anaforikan. Amma, kuma mafi muhimu, tuna cewa, cikin kalmõmi na anafoki, ma'anar nan nan na zama mafi tsananin zuwa NMT ko da matabbata. Wannan na gaskata rabarin linguistic na biyu cikin littãfin na farko na littafin teoretisk, kuma kõ da da bayyane sami'i.", 'he': 'הנייר הנוכחי חוקר את ההשפעה של מילה אחת אנפורית באנגלית על תהליך התרגום של מכונות נוירוליות (NMT) בשימוש אנגלי-הינדי כזוג מקור ושפה המטרה. כפי שציפיתי, התוצאות הניסיוניים מראות שהמערכת NMT של גוגל אנגלית-הינדית המאושרת משיגה באופן רע במשפטים שמכילים משפטים אנפוריים בהשוואה למשפטים שמכילים משפטים רגילים, לא אנפוריים. אבל, יותר חשוב, אנחנו שמים לב שבין המילים האנופוריות, שיעור השמות הוא ברור הרבה יותר קשה עבור NMT מאשר הדרמטיבים. זה מאשר מחדש את ההבדל השפתי של שתי התופעות בספרות סינטאקטית תיאורטית לאחרונה, למרות הדמיונים ברורים של השטח.', 'sk': 'V prispevku raziskujemo vpliv anaforičnih enobesed v angleščini na proces nevralnega strojnega prevajanja (NMT), ki uporablja angleško-hindijščino kot izvorni in ciljni jezikovni par. Kot je bilo pričakovano, eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da najsodobnejši Googlov angleško-hindijski sistem NMT doseže bistveno slabo pri stavkih, ki vsebujejo anaforične stavke, v primerjavi s stavki, ki vsebujejo redne, neanaforične stavke. Najpomembnejše pa je, da je med anaforičnimi besedami razred samostalnikov očitno veliko težji za NMT kot določevalci. To potrjuje jezikovno neskladje obeh pojavov v novejši teoretični sintaktični literaturi, kljub očitnim površinskim podobnostim.', 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་ནང་གི་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་གཅིག་གི་གནོད་འགྱུར འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཡོད་པའི་བརྟག་འགྲུལ་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་བཀོད་པ་ནི་Google གལ་སྲིད་ཟིན་བྲིས་པའི་ཚིག འོན་ཀྱང་། གལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་པ་དེ་ང་ཚོས་མཚོན་པའི་བརྗོད་རིས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་གྲྭར་NMT ལ་ལས་སླ་གཏོང་པར་གལ་ཆེ་བ་རེད། This reaffirms the linguistic disparity of the two phenomena in recent theoretical syntactic literature, despite the obvious surface similarities.'}
{'en': 'Unsupervised Natural Language Parsing (Introductory Tutorial)', 'ar': 'تحليل اللغة الطبيعية غير الخاضع للإشراف (دروس تمهيدية)', 'es': 'Análisis de lenguaje natural sin supervisión (tutorial introductorio)', 'pt': 'Análise de linguagem natural não supervisionada (tutorial introdutório)', 'fr': "Analyse syntaxique du langage naturel non supervisée (tutoriel d'introduction)", 'ja': '教師なし自然言語解析（入門チュートリアル）', 'zh': '无监督自然语言解析(入门教程)', 'ru': 'Неконтролируемый анализ естественного языка (вводный учебник)', 'hi': 'असुरक्षित प्राकृतिक भाषा पार्सिंग (परिचयात्मक ट्यूटोरियल)', 'ga': 'Parsáil Teanga Nádúrtha Gan Maoirseacht (Teagasc Tosaigh)', 'ka': 'ბოლო ენერგიის პარამეტრება', 'it': 'Parsing del linguaggio naturale non supervisionato (tutorial introduttivo)', 'el': 'Χωρίς παρακολούθηση ανάλυση φυσικής γλώσσας (εισαγωγικό μάθημα)', 'hu': 'Felügyeletlen természetes nyelv értelmezése (bevezető oktató)', 'kk': 'Сәйкестірілмеген табиғи тіл талдауы (интродуктуралық оқыту)', 'lt': 'Neprižiūrimas natūralios kalbos analizavimas (įžanginis mokymas)', 'mk': 'Ненадгледувано анализирање на природниот јазик (воведен уред)', 'mt': 'Analiżi tal-Lingwa Naturali Mhux Sorveljata (Tutorjal Introduttorju)', 'ms': 'Penghuraian Bahasa Alami (Tutorial Perkenalan)', 'ml': 'നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പാര്\u200dസി (ഇന്റ്രോക്ട്രോക്ട്രോക്ടറി ടിറ്ററിയല്\u200d)', 'ro': 'Interpretarea limbajului natural nesupravegheat (Tutorial introductiv)', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл шинжилгээ үзүүлэхгүй', 'pl': 'Niemonitorowane analizowanie języka naturalnego (samouczek wprowadzający)', 'no': 'Ikkje oppretta naturspråk- tolking', 'sv': 'Oserverad tolkning av naturligt språk (introduktionshandledning)', 'so': 'Heshiiska afka asalka ah ee aan ilaalinayn', 'sr': 'Nepotrebno prirodno razmatranje jezika', 'ta': 'கண்காணிக்கப்படவில்லை', 'si': 'ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව විශ්ලේෂණය නැති විශ්ලේෂණය', 'ur': 'غیر محافظت طبیعی زبان پارسینگ', 'vi': 'Trình đọc ngôn ngữ tự nhiên chưa giám sát', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'nl': 'Ongecontroleerde natuurlijke taal Parsen (Introductiehandleiding)', 'da': 'Uovervåget natursprogfortolkning (indledende vejledning)', 'hr': 'Nepotrebno prirodno razmatranje jezika', 'bg': 'Неконтролиран естествен езиков анализ (уводно ръководство)', 'de': 'Unsupervised Natural Language Parsing (Einführungs-Tutorial)', 'id': 'Penganalisan Bahasa Alami (Tutorial Perkenalan)', 'ko': '무감독 자연 언어 분석(입문 강좌)', 'sw': 'Uchapishaji wa lugha ya asili (Kifundo cha Ujumbe)', 'fa': 'تحلیل زبان طبیعی غیرقابل تحلیل', 'tr': 'Da첵ry Dili Ta첵첵arlama', 'sq': 'Analizimi i gjuhës natyrore i pa mbikqyrur (mësim paraprak)', 'am': 'የተለመደው ዕይታ', 'hy': 'Unsupervised Natural Language Parsing (Introductory Tutorial)', 'af': 'Onondersteunde Natuurlike Taal Ontlegging', 'az': 'T톛bi톛tli Dil Parsing', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা পার্সিং অনলাইন করা হয়েছে (পরিচিতি শিক্ষা)', 'bs': 'Nepotrebno prirodno razmatranje jezika', 'cs': 'Nekontrolovaná analýza přirozeného jazyka (úvodní návod)', 'et': 'Järelevalveta loodusliku keele parsimine (sissejuhatav õpetus)', 'fi': 'Tarkkailematon luonnollinen kielen jäsentäminen (johdanto-opas)', 'ca': 'Analització de llenguatges naturals sense supervisió', 'jv': 'Pertutorial Language', 'bo': 'སྔོན་བསྐྲུན་མེད་པའི་རང་བཞིན་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་འབྲི་མིན།', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מחקר שפת טבעית ללא השגחה (לימוד הכניסה)', 'sk': 'Nenadzorovano razčlenitev naravnega jezika (uvodni vadnik)'}
{'en': 'Unsupervised parsing learns a syntactic parser from training sentences without parse tree annotations. Recently, there has been a resurgence of interest in unsupervised parsing, which can be attributed to the combination of two trends in the NLP community : a general trend towards unsupervised training or pre-training, and an emerging trend towards finding or modeling linguistic structures in neural models. In this tutorial, we will introduce to the general audience what unsupervised parsing does and how it can be useful for and beyond syntactic parsing. We will then provide a systematic overview of major classes of approaches to unsupervised parsing, namely generative and discriminative approaches, and analyze their relative strengths and weaknesses. We will cover both decade-old statistical approaches and more recent neural approaches to give the audience a sense of the historical and recent development of the field. We will also discuss emerging research topics such as BERT-based approaches and visually grounded learning.', 'fr': "L'analyse syntaxique non supervisée apprend un analyseur syntaxique à partir de phrases d'entraînement sans annotations d'arbre d'analyse. Récemment, il y a eu un regain d'intérêt pour l'analyse non supervisée, ce qui peut être attribué à la combinaison de deux tendances dans la communauté de la PNL\xa0: une tendance générale vers la formation non supervisée ou pré-entraînement, et une tendance émergente vers la recherche ou la modélisation de structures linguistiques dans des modèles neuronaux. Dans ce tutoriel, nous allons présenter au grand public ce que fait l'analyse syntaxique non supervisée et comment elle peut être utile pour et au-delà de l'analyse syntaxique. Nous fournirons ensuite un aperçu systématique des principales catégories d'approches de l'analyse non supervisée, à savoir les approches génératives et discriminantes, et analyserons leurs forces et faiblesses relatives. Nous aborderons à la fois des approches statistiques vieilles de dix ans et des approches neuronales plus récentes afin de donner au public une idée de l'évolution historique et récente du domaine. Nous aborderons également des sujets de recherche émergents tels que les approches basées sur BERT et l'apprentissage visuellement ancré.", 'ar': 'يتعلم الإعراب غير الخاضع للإشراف محللًا نحويًا من جمل التدريب بدون شروح تحليل الشجرة. في الآونة الأخيرة ، كان هناك تجدد الاهتمام بالتحليل غير الخاضع للإشراف ، والذي يمكن أن يعزى إلى مزيج من اتجاهين في مجتمع البرمجة اللغوية العصبية: اتجاه عام نحو التدريب غير الخاضع للإشراف أو التدريب المسبق ، واتجاه ناشئ نحو إيجاد أو نمذجة الهياكل اللغوية في النماذج العصبية. في هذا البرنامج التعليمي ، سوف نقدم للجمهور العام ما يفعله التحليل غير الخاضع للإشراف وكيف يمكن أن يكون مفيدًا للتحليل النحوي وما هو أبعد من ذلك. سنقدم بعد ذلك نظرة عامة منهجية للفئات الرئيسية من مناهج التحليل غير الخاضع للرقابة ، أي المناهج التوليدية والتمييزية ، ونحلل نقاط القوة والضعف النسبية. سنغطي كل من الأساليب الإحصائية القديمة والنهج العصبية الأكثر حداثة لإعطاء الجمهور إحساسًا بالتطور التاريخي والحديث للمجال. سنناقش أيضًا موضوعات البحث الناشئة مثل المناهج القائمة على BERT والتعلم المرئي.', 'es': 'El análisis no supervisado aprende un analizador sintáctico de las oraciones de entrenamiento sin analizar las anotaciones del árbol. Recientemente, ha habido un resurgimiento del interés en el análisis no supervisado, que se puede atribuir a la combinación de dos tendencias en la comunidad de PNL: una tendencia general hacia el entrenamiento o preentrenamiento sin supervisión, y una tendencia emergente hacia la búsqueda o el modelado de estructuras lingüísticas en modelos neuronales. En este tutorial, presentaremos a la audiencia general lo que hace el análisis no supervisado y cómo puede ser útil para y más allá del análisis sintáctico. Luego proporcionaremos una visión general sistemática de las principales clases de enfoques para el análisis no supervisado, es decir, enfoques generativos y discriminativos, y analizaremos sus fortalezas y debilidades relativas. Cubriremos tanto los enfoques estadísticos de hace una década como los enfoques neuronales más recientes para dar a la audiencia una idea del desarrollo histórico y reciente del campo. También discutiremos temas de investigación emergentes, como los enfoques basados en BERT y el aprendizaje basado en la visión.', 'pt': 'A análise não supervisionada aprende um analisador sintático de frases de treinamento sem anotações de árvore de análise. Recentemente, tem havido um ressurgimento do interesse em análise não supervisionada, o que pode ser atribuído à combinação de duas tendências na comunidade de PNL: uma tendência geral para treinamento não supervisionado ou pré-treinamento e uma tendência emergente para encontrar ou modelar estruturas linguísticas em modelos neurais. Neste tutorial, apresentaremos ao público em geral o que a análise não supervisionada faz e como ela pode ser útil para e além da análise sintática. Em seguida, forneceremos uma visão geral sistemática das principais classes de abordagens para análise não supervisionada, ou seja, abordagens generativas e discriminativas, e analisaremos seus pontos fortes e fracos relativos. Abordaremos abordagens estatísticas de décadas e abordagens neurais mais recentes para dar ao público uma noção do desenvolvimento histórico e recente do campo. Também discutiremos tópicos de pesquisa emergentes, como abordagens baseadas em BERT e aprendizado visualmente fundamentado.', 'zh': '无监督解析习句法解析器,无解析树注。 近者,人于无监解析之兴复然,此可归因于NLP社区二势之合:无监练或预训练之总体,及神经模形之中,寻建模言语结构之新兴也。 本教程之中,受众无监解析之用,及其有用于语法解析。. 然后系统地概述无监解析之要,生判别方法析其优劣。 吾将言十年之前计近神经,使观众知其域之史最新。 又将讨论新兴之研究课题,如BERT之法,基于视听之学。', 'hi': 'असुरक्षित पार्सिंग पार्स पेड़ एनोटेशन के बिना प्रशिक्षण वाक्यों से एक वाक्यात्मक पार्सर सीखता है। हाल ही में, असुरक्षित पार्सिंग में रुचि का पुनरुत्थान हुआ है, जिसे एनएलपी समुदाय में दो रुझानों के संयोजन के लिए जिम्मेदार ठहराया जा सकता है: असुरक्षित प्रशिक्षण या पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण की ओर एक सामान्य प्रवृत्ति, और तंत्रिका मॉडल में भाषाई संरचनाओं को खोजने या मॉडलिंग की दिशा में एक उभरती हुई प्रवृत्ति। इस ट्यूटोरियल में, हम सामान्य दर्शकों को पेश करेंगे कि असुरक्षित पार्सिंग क्या करता है और यह वाक्यात्मक पार्सिंग के लिए और उससे परे कैसे उपयोगी हो सकता है। फिर हम अप्रशिक्षित पार्सिंग के लिए दृष्टिकोण के प्रमुख वर्गों का एक व्यवस्थित अवलोकन प्रदान करेंगे, अर्थात् उत्पादक और भेदभावपूर्ण दृष्टिकोण, और उनकी सापेक्ष शक्तियों और कमजोरियों का विश्लेषण करेंगे। हम दर्शकों को क्षेत्र के ऐतिहासिक और हाल के विकास की भावना देने के लिए दशकों पुराने सांख्यिकीय दृष्टिकोण और अधिक हाल के तंत्रिका दृष्टिकोण दोनों को कवर करेंगे। हम उभरते अनुसंधान विषयों जैसे कि BERT-आधारित दृष्टिकोण और नेत्रहीन आधार पर सीखने पर भी चर्चा करेंगे।', 'ja': '監督なしの構文解析は、構文解析ツリーの注釈なしのトレーニング文から構文解析器を学習します。 最近、無監督の構文解析への関心が再び高まっており、これは、NLPコミュニティにおける2つの傾向の組み合わせに起因する可能性がある。すなわち、無監督のトレーニングまたは事前トレーニングへの一般的な傾向と、ニューラルモデルにおける言語構造を見つけるまたはモデリングする新たな傾向である。 このチュートリアルでは、監督されていない構文解析が何をしているのか、構文解析にどのように役立つのかを一般の聴衆に紹介します。 次に、監視されていない構文解析へのアプローチの主要なクラス、すなわち生成的アプローチと判別的アプローチの体系的な概要を提供し、それらの相対的な長所と短所を分析します。 10年前の統計的アプローチと、聴衆にこの分野の歴史的および最近の発展を感知させるための最近のニューラルアプローチの両方を取り上げます。 また、BERTベースのアプローチや視覚的に基礎づけられた学習など、新たな研究トピックについても議論します。', 'ru': 'Неконтролируемый синтаксический разбор изучает синтаксический разбор из обучающих предложений без аннотаций дерева разбора. В последнее время наблюдается возрождение интереса к неконтролируемому синтаксическому анализу, что можно объяснить сочетанием двух тенденций в сообществе NLP: общей тенденции к неконтролируемому обучению или предварительному обучению и возникающей тенденции к поиску или моделированию лингвистических структур в нейронных моделях. В этом учебнике мы представим широкой аудитории, что делает неконтролируемый синтаксический анализ и как он может быть полезен для синтаксического синтаксического анализа и за его пределами. Затем мы дадим систематический обзор основных классов подходов к неконтролируемому синтаксическому анализу, а именно генеративного и дискриминационного подходов, и проанализируем их относительные сильные и слабые стороны. Мы рассмотрим как десятилетние статистические подходы, так и более недавние нейронные подходы, чтобы дать аудитории представление об историческом и недавнем развитии этой области. Мы также обсудим новые темы исследований, такие как подходы, основанные на BERT, и визуально обоснованное обучение.', 'ga': 'Foghlaimíonn parsáil gan mhaoirseacht parsálaí comhréire ó abairtí traenála gan nótaí crann a pharsáil. Le déanaí, tá méadú tagtha ar spéis sa pharsáil gan mhaoirseacht, rud is féidir a chur i leith an teaglaim de dhá threocht sa phobal NLP: treocht ghinearálta i dtreo oiliúint nó réamhoiliúint gan mhaoirseacht, agus treocht atá ag teacht chun cinn i dtreo struchtúir theangeolaíocha a aimsiú nó a shamhaltú i. samhlacha néaracha. Sa rang teagaisc seo, cuirfimid in iúl don lucht féachana ginearálta cad a dhéanann parsáil gan mhaoirseacht agus conas is féidir leis a bheith úsáideach le haghaidh parsála comhréire agus ina dhiaidh. Soláthróimid ansin forbhreathnú córasach ar mhór-aicmí cur chuige i leith parsála gan mhaoirseacht, is iad sin cuir chuige ghiniúna agus idirdhealaitheach, agus déanfaimid anailís ar a láidreachtaí agus a laigí coibhneasta. Clúdóimid cuir chuige staitistiúla deich mbliana d’aois agus cuir chuige néarúla níos deireanaí chun tuiscint a thabhairt don lucht féachana ar fhorbairt stairiúil agus ar fhorbairt na páirce le déanaí. Déanfaimid plé freisin ar thopaicí taighde atá ag teacht chun cinn ar nós cuir chuige bunaithe ar BERT agus foghlaim atá bunaithe ar fhís.', 'ka': 'არაფერიზებული პარაქტირება სწავლის სინტაქტიული პარაქტირება მართლადან განაკეთებული სიტყვების შესახებ, რომელიც არაფერიზებულია. მიმდინარე, იყო ინტერესენტის შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც NLP საზოგადოებაში ორი ტენდენციების კომბიზაციაში შეიძლება ატრიბუტირება: საერთო ტენდენცია, რომელიც არ განსხვავებული განსწავლებას ან წინ განსწავლებას, და აღმოჩენებული ტენდე ამ სტუტორიაში, ჩვენ უნდა დავიწყენოთ საერთო აუდიტორიაში რას გავაკეთება, როგორ შეიძლება იყოს სინტექტიკური პასუტირებისთვის და გარეშე. შემდეგ ჩვენ დავიყენებთ სისტემატიკური გადავადგინოთ მნიშვნელოვანი კლასების შესახებ, რომელიც განსხვავებული გადაწყენება, ანუ განსხვავებული და დისკრიმინატიური გადაწყენება, და გადაწყენება მა ჩვენ დავაკეთებთ ორივე წლის სტატისტიკური პროგრამები და უფრო ახალი ნეიროლური პროგრამები, რომელიც აუდისონტებისთვის ისტორიული და ახალი განვითარების სიგრძნობ ჩვენ ასევე დავუბრუნეთ ახალგაზრდებული სწავლის ტემები, როგორც BERT-დაბათებული პროგრამები და ვიზუალურად დავიწყებული სწავლება.', 'hu': 'A felügyeletlen elemzés megtanulja a szintaktikus elemzőt az elemzési fa jegyzetek nélküli mondatokból. Az utóbbi időben újra fellendült az érdeklődés a felügyelet nélküli elemzés iránt, ami az NLP közösségben tapasztalható két tendencia kombinációjának tulajdonítható: a felügyelet nélküli képzés vagy előképzés iránti általános tendencia, valamint a nyelvi struktúrák neurális modellekben történő megtalálására vagy modellezésére irányuló tendencia. Ebben a bemutatóban bemutatjuk az általános közönségnek, hogy mit tesz a felügyelet nélküli elemzés, és hogyan lehet hasznos a szintaktikus elemzéshez és azon túl. Ezután szisztematikus áttekintést nyújtunk a felügyelet nélküli elemzés főbb osztályairól, nevezetesen a generációs és diszkriminatív megközelítésekről, és elemezzük azok relatív erősségeit és gyengeségeit. Mind az évtizedes statisztikai megközelítéseket, mind a legújabb neurális megközelítéseket fedjük fel annak érdekében, hogy a közönség megértse a terület történelmi és közelmúltbeli fejlődését. Megvitatjuk továbbá a felmerülő kutatási témákat, mint például a BERT-alapú megközelítések és a vizuálisan alapozott tanulás.', 'el': 'Η μη εποπτευόμενη ανάλυση μαθαίνει έναν συντακτικό αναλυτή από προτάσεις κατάρτισης χωρίς σχόλια δέντρου ανάλυσης. Πρόσφατα, υπήρξε μια αναζωπύρωση του ενδιαφέροντος για την ανάλυση χωρίς επίβλεψη, η οποία μπορεί να αποδοθεί στον συνδυασμό δύο τάσεων στην κοινότητα: μια γενική τάση προς την εκπαίδευση χωρίς επίβλεψη ή προεκπαίδευση, και μια αναδυόμενη τάση για την εύρεση ή τη μοντελοποίηση γλωσσικών δομών σε νευρωνικά μοντέλα. Σε αυτό το σεμινάριο, θα εισαγάγουμε στο ευρύ κοινό τι κάνει η χωρίς επίβλεψη ανάλυση και πώς μπορεί να είναι χρήσιμη για και πέρα από τη συντακτική ανάλυση. Στη συνέχεια, θα παράσχουμε μια συστηματική επισκόπηση των βασικών κατηγοριών προσεγγίσεων για την άνευ επίβλεπτης ανάλυσης, δηλαδή των παραγωγικών και διακριτικών προσεγγίσεων, και θα αναλύσουμε τις σχετικές δυνάμεις και αδυναμίες τους. Θα καλύψουμε τόσο τις στατιστικές προσεγγίσεις δεκαετιών όσο και τις πιο πρόσφατες νευρωνικές προσεγγίσεις για να δώσουμε στο κοινό μια αίσθηση της ιστορικής και πρόσφατης ανάπτυξης του πεδίου. Θα συζητήσουμε επίσης αναδυόμενα ερευνητικά θέματα, όπως προσεγγίσεις βασισμένες στο BERT και οπτικά θεμελιωμένη μάθηση.', 'it': "L'analisi non supervisionata impara un parser sintattico dalla formazione di frasi senza annotazioni sull'albero di parse. Recentemente, c'è stato un ritorno di interesse per il parsing non supervisionato, che può essere attribuito alla combinazione di due tendenze nella comunità NLP: una tendenza generale verso la formazione non supervisionata o pre-formazione, e una tendenza emergente verso la ricerca o la modellazione di strutture linguistiche nei modelli neurali. In questo tutorial, introdurremo al pubblico generale cosa fa l'analisi non supervisionata e come può essere utile per e oltre l'analisi sintattica. Forniremo quindi una panoramica sistematica delle principali classi di approcci al parsing non supervisionato, vale a dire approcci generativi e discriminatori, e analizzeremo i loro punti di forza e di debolezza relativi. Tratteremo sia approcci statistici decennali che approcci neurali più recenti per dare al pubblico un senso dello sviluppo storico e recente del settore. Discuteremo anche argomenti di ricerca emergenti come approcci basati su BERT e apprendimento basato su basi visive.", 'lt': 'Neprižiūrimas analizavimas iš mokymo sakinių išmoko sintaksinį analizatorių be analizuojamų medžių annotacijų. Pastaruoju metu atsirado susidomėjimas neapdorotu analizavimu, kuris gali būti susijęs su dviejų NLP bendruomenės tendencijų deriniu: bendra tendencija į neapdorotą mokymą ar parengiamąjį mokymą ir nauja tendencija rasti ar modeliuoti kalbines struktūras nervų modeliuose. Šiame mokyme pristatysime visuomenei, ką atlieka neaprižiūrimas analizavimas ir kaip jis gali būti naudingas sintetiniam analizavimui ir už jo ribų. Tuomet sistemingai apžvelgsime svarbiausių klasių metodus, susijusius su nepastebimu analizavimu, t. y. generacinius ir diskriminacinius metodus, ir išanalizuosime jų santykinius stiprumus ir trūkumus. Mes apimsime tiek dešimtmečio senus statistinius metodus, tiek naujausius nervinius metodus, kad auditorija galėtų suprasti istorinę ir naujausią šios srities plėtrą. Taip pat aptarsime naujas mokslinių tyrimų temas, pvz., BERT grindžiamus metodus ir vizualiai pagrįstą mokymąsi.', 'kk': 'Бұтақтағы мәліметтерді талдау үшін синтактикалық талдауын оқыды. Жуырда NLP қоғамдарының екі тенденцияларын біріктіруге болады: жалпы оқыту не алдын- оқыту үшін жалпы тенденциясы, невралдық модельдерде лингвистикалық құрылымдарды табу не моделлеу тенденциясы. Бұл оқушылықта, синтактикалық талдау үшін және қалай пайдалы болуы мүмкіндігін жалпы аудиторияларға таңдаймыз. Содан кейін бұл талдау үшін негізгі жағдайларды жүйелік түрде қарап, жасалмаған және дискриминациялық жағдайларының және салыстырмалы күштерін және қауіпсіздерін анализ етеміз. Біз оның жылдық ескі статистикалық жағдайды және соңғы невралдық жағдайды аудиторияға тарыхый және соңғы жағдайды түсіндіру үшін түсіндіреміз. Біз сондай-ақ BERT-негіздеген жаңа зерттеулерді және көрінетін оқыту мәселелерін талқылаймыз.', 'mk': 'Ненадгледувано анализирање научи синтактички анализатор од вежбање реченици без анализирање на дрвјата. Неодамна, се појави интерес за ненадгледувано анализирање, кое може да се припише на комбинацијата на две трендови во заедницата НЛП: генерален тренд кон ненадгледувано обука или преобука, и развивачки тренд кон пронаоѓање или моделирање на лингвистичките структури во неуралните модели. Во овој наставник, ќе им претставиме на генералната публика што прави ненадгледуваното анализирање и како може да биде корисно за и надвор од синтактичкото анализирање. Потоа ќе обезбедиме систематски преглед на главните класи на пристапи кон ненадгледуваното анализирање, имено генеративни и дискриминативни пристапи, и ќе ги анализираме нивните релативни сили и слабости. Ние ќе ги покриеме и децениумските статистички пристапи и понатамошните неурални пристапи за да им дадеме на публиката чувство за историскиот и неодамнешниот развој на теренот. Ние, исто така, ќе разговараме за новите истражувачки теми како што се пристапите базирани на БЕРТ и визуелно основано учење.', 'ms': 'Menghurai tanpa diawasi mempelajari hurai sintaktik dari kalimat latihan tanpa hurai anotasi pokok. Baru-baru ini, terdapat kebangkitan tertarik dalam penghuraian tidak diawasi, yang boleh ditakrif kepada kombinasi dua trends dalam komuniti NLP: trends umum ke arah latihan tidak diawasi atau pralatihan, dan trends yang muncul ke arah mencari atau modelkan struktur bahasa dalam model saraf. Dalam tutorial ini, kami akan memperkenalkan kepada penonton umum apa penghuraian tidak diawasi lakukan dan bagaimana ia boleh berguna untuk dan diluar penghuraian sintaktik. Kemudian kita akan menyediakan pandangan sistemik bagi kelas utama pendekatan untuk penghuraian tidak diawasi, iaitu pendekatan generatif dan diskriminatif, dan menganalisis kekuatan dan kelemahan relatif mereka. Kita akan menutupi kedua-dua pendekatan statistik berusia dekade dan pendekatan saraf yang baru-baru ini untuk memberikan penonton rasa tentang pembangunan sejarah dan baru-baru ini lapangan. Kami juga akan membincangkan topik kajian yang muncul seperti pendekatan berasaskan BERT dan pembelajaran yang berasaskan secara visual.', 'mt': "L-analiżi mhux sorveljata titgħallem analizzatur sintetiku minn sentenzi ta’ taħriġ mingħajr annotazzjonijiet tas-siġar tal-analiżi. Dan l-a ħħar, kien hemm riġenerazzjoni ta’ interess fl-analiżi mhux sorveljata, li tista’ tiġi attribwita għat-taħlita ta’ żewġ xejriet fil-komunità NLP: xejra ġenerali lejn taħriġ mhux sorveljat jew taħriġ minn qabel, u xejra emerġenti lejn is-sejba jew l-immudellar ta’ strutturi lingwistiċi f’mudelli newrali. F’dan it-tutorjal, se nintroduċu lill-udjenza ġenerali x’tagħmel l-analiżi mhux sorveljata u kif tista’ tkun utli għall-analiżi sintetika u lil hinn minnha. Imbagħad se nipprovdu ħarsa ġenerali sistematika lejn il-klassijiet ewlenin ta' approċċi għall-analiżi mhux sorveljata, jiġifieri approċċi ġenerattivi u diskriminatorji, u nianalizzaw il-qawwiet u d-dgħufijiet relattivi tagħhom. Aħna se nkopru kemm approċċi statistiċi ta' għaxar snin u approċċi newrali aktar reċenti biex nagħtu lill-udjenza sens tal-iżvilupp storiku u reċenti tal-qasam. Se niddiskutu wkoll suġġetti emerġenti tar-riċerka bħall-approċċi bbażati fuq il-BERT u t-tagħlim viżwali.", 'ml': 'നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങ് ഒരു സിനിട്ടാക്റ്റിക്ക് പരിശീലന വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്ക അടുത്തിടെ സൂക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങിന്റെ താല്പര്യമുണ്ടായിരുന്നു. അത് NLP സമൂഹത്തില്\u200d രണ്ടു പാട്ടുകളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തിലാക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു. സൂക്ഷിക്കാത്ത പരിശീലിക്കാനോ  ഈ വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തില്\u200d, സൂക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നതെന്താണെന്നും സംരക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത പാര്\u200dഗിങ്ങിനും അത പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d സിസ്റ്റമിക്കുന്ന പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങിനെ സംരക്ഷിക്കാത്ത മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങളുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് ഒരു പരിശോധിക് നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു കൊല്ലത്തിനും പുരാതനപ്പെട്ട സ്റ്റാസ്റ്റിസ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d നടപടികള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമാക്കും. പ്രദേശത്തിന്റെ ചരിത്രത്തിലും  ബെര്\u200dട്ടി അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള നേര്\u200dവഴികളും കാഴ്ചയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ പഠനം പോലെ', 'mn': 'Шинжлэх боломжгүй хуваалцах нь модны жагсаалтыг шинжилгээгүй суралцах өгүүлбэрээс синтактикийн хуваалцагч суралцаж байна. Сүүлийн үед NLP нийгмийн хоёр тенденцийн холбогдолтой холбогдолтой холбогдолтой сонирхолтой болсон. Энэ нь сургалт эсвэл урд сургалтын тухай ерөнхий тенденцийг, мэдрэлийн загварын хэлний бүтээлүүдийг олох эсвэл загварчлахын тулд шинэ тенденцийг ашиглаж байна. Энэ сургалтын тухай бид ерөнхий үзэгчдэд юу хийдэг, юу хийдэг вэ гэдгийг харуулъя. Дараа нь бид үндсэн хуваалцааны тухай ойлголтын тухай систематикийн тухай ойлголт хангах болно. Энэ нь бүтээлч, ялгаагүй арга барилга, харьцангуй хүчтэй, хүчтэй байдлыг шинжилгээ хийх болно. Бид 10 жилийн хугацааны статистикийн арга барилга болон саяхан сэтгэл зүйн арга барилгыг сонсогчид дэлхийн түүх болон сүүлийн хөгжлийн мэдрэмж өгөх болно. Мөн бид БЕРТ-н сургалтын тулд шинэ судалгааны сэдэв, харааны сургалтын тухай ярилцах болно.', 'pl': 'Nienadzorowane parsowanie uczy się parser składni ze zdań treningowych bez adnotacji drzewa parsowania. Ostatnio nastąpiło ponowne pojawienie się zainteresowania parsowaniem bez nadzoru, co można przypisać połączeniu dwóch trendów w społeczności NLP: ogólnego trendu w kierunku szkolenia bez nadzoru lub przedszkolenia oraz pojawiającego się trendu w kierunku znalezienia lub modelowania struktur językowych w modelach neuronowych. W tym poradniku przedstawimy ogólnej publiczności, co robi parsowanie bez nadzoru i jak może być przydatne dla parsowania składni i poza nią. Następnie przedstawimy systematyczny przegląd głównych klas podejść do parsowania bez nadzoru, a mianowicie podejścia generatywne i dyskryminacyjne, oraz analizujemy ich względne mocne i słabe strony. Będziemy obejmować zarówno dekadowe podejścia statystyczne, jak i bardziej nowe podejścia neuronowe, aby dać publiczności poczucie historycznego i ostatniego rozwoju tej dziedziny. Omówimy również pojawiające się tematy badawcze, takie jak podejścia oparte na BERT i uczenie się wizualnie.', 'ro': 'Analizarea nesupravegheată învață un parser sintactic din propozițiile de instruire fără adnotări de arbore de parsare. Recent, a existat o reapariție a interesului pentru analizarea nesupravegheată, care poate fi atribuită combinației a două tendințe din comunitatea PNL: o tendință generală către formarea nesupravegheată sau pre-formare și o tendință emergentă către găsirea sau modelarea structurilor lingvistice în modelele neurale. În acest tutorial, vom prezenta publicului general ce face analizarea nesupravegheată și cum poate fi utilă pentru și dincolo de analizarea sintactică. Vom oferi apoi o imagine de ansamblu sistematică a claselor majore de abordări ale analizării nesupravegheate, și anume abordări generative și discriminatorii, și vom analiza punctele forte și slăbiciunile lor relative. Vom acoperi atât abordări statistice vechi de zece ani, cât și abordări neurale mai recente pentru a oferi publicului un sentiment al dezvoltării istorice și recente a domeniului. Vom discuta, de asemenea, subiecte de cercetare emergente, cum ar fi abordările bazate pe BERT și învățarea bazată vizual.', 'no': 'Ikkje oppretta tolking lærer ein syntaktisk tolkar frå treningssetningar utan tolking av tråmerknader. Nyleg har det vært eit opprinneleg interesse på ulike tolking, som kan bli attribuert til kombinasjonen av to trender i NLP-fellesskapet: ein generell trend mot ulike opplæring eller føreøving, og ein opprinneleg trend mot å finna eller modellera lingviske strukturer i neuralmodeller. I denne opplæringa vil vi introdusera til den generelle publikum kva ulike tolking gjer og korleis det kan vera nyttig for og utenfor syntaksiske tolking. Vi vil derfor gjera systematisk oversikt over store klasser av tilnærmingar til ulike tolkingar, som er genererande og diskriminasjonale tilnærmingar, og analysera sine relative strengde og tyrke. Vi vil dekke både tidlegare statistiske tilnærmingar og nyleg neuraltilnærmingar for å gi publikum ein følelse på historisk og nyleg utvikling av feltet. Vi vil også diskutera utgåande forskningsemne som BERT-baserte tilnærmingar og visuelt grunnleggte læring.', 'si': 'විශාලනය නොකරපු විශාලනය සිද්ධික විශාලකයෙක් ඉගෙනගන්නවා ගස් කිරීමක් නැති විශාලනයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ අවසානයෙන්, නොසුපෙර්වීම් විශ්වාසයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන්, ඒක NLP සමාජයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන්: සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නොහැ මේ ප්\u200dරධානයේ අපි සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරධානකයන්ට පුළුවන් කරන්නේ නැති ප්\u200dරධානකයෙන් මොකක්ද කරන්නේ, ඒක කොහොමද ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප අපි ඊට පස්සේ ප්\u200dරධාන වර්ගයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙන්නම්, නිර්මාණය විශ්වාසය සහ විශ්වාස කරනවා, ඒ වගේම අපි දහස්සක් පරණ පරණ සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ අන්තිම ප්\u200dරවේශකට ප්\u200dරවේශකයාට අතිහාසය සහ අන්තිම ප්\u200dරවේශනයේ අතිහ අපි පටන් ගන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට කතා කරන්නම්, බෙර්ට් අධාරිත විදිහට සහ ප්\u200dරශ්ණිත', 'so': 'Jardiinooyinka aan la ilaalinayn wuxuu ka baran karaa baaritaanka bandhigyada la xiriira waxbarashada oo aan la’aanin garsoorida geedka baarshaha. Hadii u dhowayd, waxaa jirtay dabool-xiiso ku jirta baarlamaanka a an la ilaalinayn, taas oo loo dhigi karo isku xirida labada baalal oo ka mid ah bulshada NLP: qaab caadi ah oo u jeeda waxbarasho aan la ilaalinayn ama waxbarasho ka hor-socon, iyo qaab soo socda oo u soo socda si uu u helo ama u sameynayo dhismaha luuqada ee noocyada neurada ah. Waxbarashadan ayaannu dadka guud u soo bandhigaynaa waxa ay sameeyaan baarlamaanka aan la ilaalinayn iyo siduu u faa’iido u noqon karo baarlamaanka oo aan ka badnayn. Markaas waxaan soo bandhigaynaa kooxaha waaweyn ee baarlamaanka aan la ilaalin karin, kuwaas oo ah dhaqdhaqaaq iyo takoorid, waxaana baaraynaa xooggooda qaraabada iyo itaaldarradooda. Waxaannu qarinaynaa labada habbooyinka takhasuska ee tobanka sano jir ah iyo habbooyinka neurada ee ugu dambeeya si aan dhegaha u siiyo fikrada taariikhda iyo horumarinta ee duurka. Waxaannu sidoo kale ka sheekeysanaynaa maadooyinka waxbarashada soo socda, tusaale ahaan qaabilaada ku saleysan BERT iyo barashada aragtida.', 'sr': 'Neobezbeđeno parsanje nauči sintaktičkog analizatora iz treninga rečenica bez analizanja annotacija drveta. Nedavno je došlo do povratka interesa o neodređenom razmatranju, koja se može pripisati kombinaciji dva trend a u zajednici NLP: općem trenutku prema neodređenoj obuci ili predobuci, i pojavljujući trend prema pronalaženju ili modeliranju jezičkih struktura u neuralnim modelima. U ovom nastavniku, predstavićemo generalnoj publiki ono što radi neodređeno analiziranje i kako može biti korisno za sintaktičko analiziranje i izvan toga. Onda ćemo pružiti sistematski pregled velikih razreda pristupa neodređenom razmatranju, a to je generativna i diskriminativna pristupa, i analizirati njihove relativne snage i slabosti. Pokrivaæemo i decenijalne statističke pristupe i nedavne neuralne pristupe kako bi publiki dali oseæaj istorijskog i nedavnog razvoja terena. Takođe ćemo razgovarati o novim istraživačkim temama kao što su pristupi na BERT-u i vizualno osnovani učenje.', 'sv': 'Oserverad tolkning l채r sig en syntaktisk tolkning fr책n tr채ning av meningar utan tolkningstr채dkommentarer. Nyligen har intresset f철r o철vervakad tolkning 철kat igen, vilket kan tillskrivas kombinationen av tv책 trender inom NLP-gemenskapen: en allm채n trend mot o철vervakad tr채ning eller pre-tr채ning och en framv채xande trend mot att hitta eller modellera spr책kliga strukturer i neurala modeller. I denna handledning kommer vi att introducera f철r allm채nheten vad o철vervakad tolkning g철r och hur den kan vara anv채ndbar f철r och bortom syntaktisk tolkning. Vi kommer sedan att ge en systematisk 철versikt 철ver st철rre klasser av tillv채gag책ngss채tt f철r o철vervakad tolkning, n채mligen generativa och diskriminerande tillv채gag책ngss채tt, och analysera deras relativa styrkor och svagheter. Vi kommer att t채cka b책de 책rtionden gamla statistiska tillv채gag책ngss채tt och nyare neurala tillv채gag책ngss채tt f철r att ge publiken en k채nsla av den historiska och senaste utvecklingen av omr책det. Vi kommer ocks책 att diskutera nya forsknings채mnen som BERT-baserade tillv채gag책ngss채tt och visuellt grundat l채rande.', 'ta': 'கண்காணிக்கப்படாத பாடல் ஒரு ஒத்திசைவு வாக்கியங்களிலிருந்து பயிற்சியில் இருந்து ஒரு ஒத்திசைவு பாடல்  சமீபத்தில், சேமிக்கப்படாத பாடலுக்கு வட்டி திரும்பச் செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது, அது NLP சமூகத்தில் இரண்டு நட்சத்திரங்களை ஒன்று சேர்க்க முடியும்: காப்பாற்றப்படாத பயிற்சி அல்லது முன் பயிற்சியின இந்த பொருளில், காப்பாற்றப்படாத பாடல் என்ன செய்கிறது என்பதை பொது பார்வைகளுக்கு நாம் அறிமுகப்படுத்துவோம் மற்றும் அது எவ்வாறு ஒ பிறகு நாம் காப்பாற்றப்படாத பாடலுக்கு மிகப்பெரிய முறைகளை கண்காணிப்போம், பொதுவான மற்றும் வித்தியாசமான முறைகள் மற்றும் அவர்களுடைய சார்ந்த வல நாம் இரண்டு பத்தாண்டு வயது புள்ளிவிவரம் வழிகளையும் மற்றும் சமீபத்தில் புதிய புதிய நெறி நெருக்கங்களையும் மற்றும் புலத்தின்  பெருக்கும் ஆராய்ச்சி தலைப்புகளை பிரெட் அடிப்படையில் உள்ள அணுகல் மற்றும் பார்வையில் நிறுத்தப்பட்ட கல்வி', 'ur': 'غیرقابل پارسینگ ایک سینٹاکسی پارسینٹ سیکھا جاتا ہے کہ درخت انٹیٹیزوں کے بغیر پارسینٹ کے سٹرین سنٹیسی پارسینٹ سے۔ اچھے وقت، ناپارسی پارسینگ میں علاقه کا دوبارہ اٹھایا گیا ہے، جو NLP کمونٹی میں دو ٹرنڈوں کی ترکیب کے ساتھ تسبیح کر سکتا ہے: ایک عمومی ترکیب ناپارسی تطالب یا پیش آموزش کی طرف، اور ایک نئورل موڈل میں زبان کی ساختاریوں کی تلاش یا مدل کرنے کے لئے اضافہ ہوتا ہے. یہ تعلیم میں، ہم سب لوگوں کو معلوم کریں گے جو غیر قابل تعلیم کیا کرتا ہے اور اس کا کیسا فائدہ ہو سکتا ہے سینٹکتیک پارسینگ کے لئے اور اس کے بعد۔ اس کے بعد ہم ایک سیستم نظر کریں گے کہ بڑے کلاس کے مطابق تقسیم کرنے کے لئے ناپاکیزہ تقسیم کرنے کے لئے، یعنی پیدا کرنے والی اور تقسیم کرنے والی تقسیم، اور ان کے رشتہ دار قوت اور ضعیفیت کا تحقیق کریں۔ ہم دونوں دس سالوں کی آمار سیاسی طریقے اور اچھے نئورل طریقے پر پورے کریں گے تاریخی اور اچھی طریقے کی توسعہ بتانے کے لئے۔ ہم بھی پیدا ہونے والی تحقیق موضوع کی بحث کریں گے جیسے BERT-based approaches اور visually grounded learning.', 'uz': "Koʻrib chiqarilmagan parcha taʼminlovchi soʻzlardan birlashtirish imkoniyatlarini o'rganadi. Yaqinda, xavob berilmagan parchaga ishlatilmagan qiziqni qaytadan foydalanish mumkin, bu NLP jamoasidagi ikki holatlarni birlashtirish mumkin: saqlab qolmagan trening yoki oldingi trening umumiy holati, va neyrolik modelidagi tillarni topish yoki modellash uchun kelayotgan holat. Bu ta'limda, biz tashkilotni saqlab qolmagan parsing qanday qilishini va uni qanday foydalanishi mumkin va qanday qo'llanmalar bo'ladi. Keyin biz tasavvur qilinadigan tashkilotlarni tasavvur qilamiz, umumiy va ajratish usullar, va ularning qo'shimcha қувватлар ва заифликларини тафаккур қиламиз. Biz ikkita yil yil oldin statistical usullarni qaramiz va yaqinda yangi neyron usullarni o'zgarishlarning tarixiy va yaqinda taʼminlovchi darajada o'zgarishga hisoblanamiz. Biz kelayotgan taʼminot mavzularini BERT asosida ko'p o'rganishga va ko'rinishni o'rganishga qaramamiz.", 'vi': 'Không giám sát phân tích học một phân tích cú pháp từ câu tập luyện không cần chú thích cây. Gần đây, có sự hồi phục quan tâm đến việc phân tích không giám sát, mà có thể được gán cho sự kết hợp của hai xu hướng trong cộng đồng Njala: một xu hướng chung về việc huấn luyện hay tiền đào tạo không được giám sát, và một xu hướng phát triển về việc tìm hay tạo cấu trúc ngôn ngữ trong các mô hình thần kinh. Trong tập đoàn này, chúng ta sẽ giới thiệu cho khán giả xem cách phân tích không giám sát và cách nó có thể hữu ích cho và ngoài cách phân tích cú pháp. Sau đó, chúng ta sẽ cung cấp một hệ thống tổng quát các lớp lớn của các phương pháp phân tích không giám sát, cụ thể là các phương pháp sinh sản và phân biệt, và phân tích điểm mạnh và yếu của họ. Chúng ta sẽ bao gồm cả thập kỷ các phương pháp thống kê và các tiếp cận thần kinh gần đây để cho khán giả cảm nhận về sự phát triển lịch sử và gần đây của lĩnh vực. Chúng ta cũng sẽ thảo luận các chủ đề nghiên cứu mới hơn như các phương pháp nuôi sót sót và học trực tiếp.', 'bg': 'Неконтролираното анализиране научава синтактичен анализатор от тренировъчни изречения без анализиране на анотации в дървото. Напоследък се наблюдава възобновяване на интереса към ненадзорното анализиране, което може да се приписва на комбинацията от две тенденции в общността на НЛП: обща тенденция към ненадзорно обучение или предобучение и възникваща тенденция към намиране или моделиране на лингвистични структури в невронните модели. В този урок ще представим на широката аудитория какво прави ненадзорният анализ и как може да бъде полезен за и извън синтактичен анализ. След това ще предоставим систематичен преглед на основните класове подходи към ненадзорния анализ, а именно генеративни и дискриминационни подходи, и ще анализираме техните относителни силни и слаби страни. Ще разгледаме както десетилетия стари статистически подходи, така и по-нови невронни подходи, за да дадем на публиката представа за историческото и скорошното развитие на областта. Ще обсъдим и нововъзникващи изследователски теми като базирани подходи и визуално обосновано обучение.', 'da': 'Uovervåget parsing lærer en syntaktisk parser fra træning af sætninger uden parse træ annotationer. For nylig har der været en genopstået interesse for ukontrolleret fortolkning, hvilket kan tilskrives kombinationen af to tendenser i NLP-samfundet: en generel tendens til ukontrolleret træning eller forudgående træning og en nyere tendens til at finde eller modellere sproglige strukturer i neurale modeller. I denne vejledning vil vi introducere til det generelle publikum, hvad uopvåget parsing gør, og hvordan det kan være nyttigt for og ud over syntaktisk parsing. Vi vil derefter give et systematisk overblik over større klasser af tilgange til ukontrolleret parsing, nemlig generative og diskriminerende tilgange, og analysere deres relative styrker og svagheder. Vi vil dække både årti gamle statistiske tilgange og nyere neurale tilgange for at give publikum en fornemmelse af den historiske og nylige udvikling af feltet. Vi vil også diskutere nye forskningsemner såsom BERT-baserede tilgange og visuelt grundlagt læring.', 'hr': 'Nepotrebno analiziranje uči sintaktički analiziranje od treninga rečenica bez analiziranja annotacija drveta. Nedavno je došlo do povratka interesa o neodređenom razmatranju, koja se može priključiti kombinaciji dva trend a u zajednici NLP-a: općem trenutku prema neodređenoj obuci ili predobuci i pojavljujući trend prema pronalaženju ili modeliranju jezičkih struktura u neuralnim modelima. U ovom nastavniku, predstavit ćemo generalnoj publiki ono što čini neodređeno analiziranje i kako može biti korisno za sintaktičko analiziranje i izvan toga. Onda ćemo pružiti sistematski pregled velikih razreda pristupa neodređenom razmatranju, a to je generativna i diskriminirana pristupa, te analizirati njihove relativne snage i slabosti. Pokrivat ćemo i decenijalne statističke pristupe i nedavne neurološke pristupe kako bi publiki dali osjećaj povijesti i nedavnog razvoja terena. Također ćemo razgovarati o novim istraživačkim temama poput pristupa na BERT-u i vizualno osnovanog učenja.', 'nl': 'Onbewaakte parsing leert een syntactische parser van trainingszinnen zonder parse tree annotaties. Onlangs is er een opleving van belangstelling voor onbeheerde parsing, wat kan worden toegeschreven aan de combinatie van twee trends in de NLP-gemeenschap: een algemene trend naar training zonder toezicht of pre-training, en een opkomende trend naar het vinden of modelleren van taalstructuren in neurale modellen. In deze tutorial introduceren we het algemene publiek wat onbeheerde parsen doet en hoe het nuttig kan zijn voor en buiten syntactische parsen. Vervolgens zullen we een systematisch overzicht geven van de belangrijkste klassen van benaderingen van onbeheerde parsing, namelijk generatieve en discriminerende benaderingen, en hun relatieve sterke en zwakke punten analyseren. We behandelen zowel decennia oude statistische benaderingen als meer recente neurale benaderingen om het publiek een gevoel te geven van de historische en recente ontwikkeling van het veld. We zullen ook opkomende onderzoeksonderwerpen bespreken, zoals BERT-gebaseerde benaderingen en visueel geaard leren.', 'id': 'Menghurai tanpa nadi belajar penghurai sintaks dari kalimat latihan tanpa hurai anotasi pohon. Baru-baru ini, ada kebangkitan tertarik dalam pemeriksaan yang tidak diawasi, yang dapat ditanggung oleh kombinasi dua trends di komunitas NLP: trends umum menuju pelatihan yang tidak diawasi atau prapelatihan, dan trends yang muncul menuju menemukan atau model struktur bahasa dalam model saraf. Dalam tutorial ini, kita akan memperkenalkan kepada penonton umum apa yang tidak diawasi penghuraian lakukan dan bagaimana itu dapat berguna untuk dan diluar penghuraian sintaksi. Kemudian kita akan menyediakan pandangan sistematis dari kelas utama pendekatan untuk pemeriksaan tidak diawasi, yaitu pendekatan generatif dan diskriminatif, dan menganalisis kekuatan dan kelemahan relatif mereka. We will cover both decade-old statistical approaches and more recent neural approaches to give the audience a sense of the historical and recent development of the field.  Kami juga akan mendiskusikan topik penelitian muncul seperti pendekatan berdasarkan BERT dan belajar secara visual.', 'ko': '무감독 문법 분석은 문법 트리 주석이 없는 문장 훈련에서 문법 분석기를 배웠다.최근에 사람들이 무감독 문법 분석에 대한 흥미가 다시 생겼다. 이것은 NLP 지역사회에서 두 가지 추세의 결합, 즉 무감독 훈련이나 예훈련의 전체적인 추세, 그리고 신경 모델에서 발견되거나 모델링된 언어 구조의 신흥 추세 때문이다.본 강좌에서 우리는 일반 관중에게 무감독 문법 분석의 작용과 문법 분석에 어떻게 유용한지, 그리고 문법 분석을 어떻게 초월하는지 소개할 것이다.그 다음에 우리는 무감독 문법 분석의 주요 방법, 즉 생성식과 구분식 방법을 체계적으로 개술하고 그들의 상대적인 우세와 열세를 분석할 것이다.10년의 역사를 가진 통계 방법과 최근의 신경 방법을 소개해 이 분야의 역사와 최신 발전을 시청자들에게 알릴 예정이다.버트에 기초한 방법과 시각적 기초 학습 등 새로운 연구 주제도 논의할 것이다.', 'de': 'Unsupervised Parsing lernt einen syntaktischen Parser aus Trainingssätzen ohne Parse Tree Anmerkungen. In letzter Zeit ist das Interesse am unüberwachten Parsing wieder aufgetaucht, was auf die Kombination zweier Trends in der NLP-Gemeinschaft zurückzuführen ist: ein allgemeiner Trend hin zu unbeaufsichtigtem Training oder Pre-Training und ein aufkommender Trend zur Suche oder Modellierung linguistischer Strukturen in neuronalen Modellen. In diesem Tutorial stellen wir dem allgemeinen Publikum vor, was unüberwachtes Parsen tut und wie es für und über syntaktisches Parsen hinaus nützlich sein kann. Anschließend geben wir einen systematischen Überblick über die wichtigsten Klassen von Ansätzen zum unüberwachten Parsing, nämlich generative und diskriminierende Ansätze, und analysieren deren relative Stärken und Schwächen. Wir werden sowohl jahrzehntealte statistische Ansätze als auch neuere neuronale Ansätze behandeln, um dem Publikum ein Gefühl für die historische und jüngste Entwicklung des Feldes zu geben. Darüber hinaus diskutieren wir neue Forschungsthemen wie BERT-basierte Ansätze und visuell geerdetes Lernen.', 'sw': 'Unsupervised parsing learns a syntactic parser from training sentences without parse tree annotations.  Hivi karibuni, kumekuwa na msingi wa maslahi ya kuvutiwa na wimbo usio na uhakika, ambao unaweza kuhusiana na muunganiko wa mitindo miwili katika jamii ya NLP: mwenendo mkubwa wa mafunzo yasiyoeleweka au mafunzo ya kabla, na mwenendo unaoendelea kwa kutafuta au kutengeneza miundombinu ya lugha katika mifano ya kisasa. Katika somo hili, tutawatambulisha hadhira kwa ujumla kile kinachofanya parge zisizo na uhakika na jinsi gani hiyo inaweza kuwa na manufaa kwa ajili na zaidi ya wimbo wa ushirikiano. Kisha tutatoa mtazamo wa mfumo wa makundi makubwa ya mikakati ya mabunge yasiyoeleweka, ikiwa ni mbinu za kizalendo na za ubaguzi, na tutachambua nguvu za ndugu na udhaifu wao. Tutakuwa tukitangaza mbinu za takwimu za miaka miongo na mbinu za hivi karibuni za neura za kuwapa hadhira hisia za maendeleo ya kihistoria na ya hivi karibuni ya uwanjani. Pia tutajadili mada za utafiti zinazotokea kama vile mbinu za msingi wa BERT na kujifunza kwa maoni.', 'fa': 'تحلیل غیرقابل تحلیل یک متخصص سنتاکتیک از جمله\u200cهای آموزش بدون توضیح\u200cهای درخت را یاد می\u200cگیرد. اخیراً به ترکیب دو ترکیب در جامعه NLP، یک ترکیب عمومی برای آموزش غیرقابل تحصیل یا پیش آموزش، و یک ترکیب پیدا می\u200cشود به پیدا کردن یا مدل\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی در مدل\u200cهای عصبی. در این تدریس، ما به تماشاگران عمومی معرفی می\u200cکنیم که کاری انجام می\u200cدهد که تدریس غیرقابل تحریک می\u200cکند و چگونه می\u200cتواند برای تدریس سنتاکتیک و فراتر از آن سودمند باشد. سپس یک نظر سیستماتی از کلاس های بزرگ دسترسی برای تجزیه کردن غیرقابل تحقیق می کنیم، یعنی دسترسی های ژنترافی و جدایی، و قدرت و ضعیفی نسبت به آنها تحلیل می کنیم. ما هر دو دستورات آمار دهه قدیمی و دستورات عصبی اخیر را پوشش خواهیم داد تا به مردم احساس تاریخی و توسعه تاریخی این زمینه را بدهیم. ما همچنین در مورد موضوع تحقیقات پیشرفته\u200cای مثل روش\u200cهای بنیاد BERT و یادگیری بنیاد دیده\u200cای صحبت می\u200cکنیم.', 'tr': 'Saýlamak üçin ahyrlamak üçin agaç täzeliklerini okamak üçin syntaktik täzelikçi öwrenýär. Soňky wagtlarda, tassyklanmadyk parslama bilen gyzyklanýan bir ýoly bar. NLP jemgyýetinde iki ýoly üýtgetmegiňe golaýlaşyp biler. NLP jemgyýetiniň üýtgetmeli eğitim ýa öňünden öňünden eğitim ýa-da öňünden öňünde bolan ýa-da lingwistiki düzümlenmäge golaýlaşýan bir täsir. Bu tutuşturmada, suçsuz analyzmanyň ne işe yarandygyny we sintaktik analyzmanyň üstünde nähili faydaly bolup biler bilýäni umumy publika tanyşýarys. Soňra özümize garamazdan ayırmak üçin esasy taýýarlaryň önüm synplaryny sistemäpli bir görnüş berjegimiz, diýip döredijili we diskrimi ýakynlaşyklaryny çözürýäris we olaryň görnüş güýçleri we zayımlaryny çözürýäris. Biz on ýyl öňki istatistik ýagdaýlary we ýakyn nural ýagdaýlaryny publikasyna geçmiş we ýakyn ösümlişiniň habaryny berjek. Biz hem BERT tabanly golaýlary we görsel terjime öwrenmeleri ýaly täzeden araştyrma temalaryny gürrüň ederis.', 'af': "Onondersteunde verwerking leer 'n sintaktieke ontleerder van onderwerp setnings sonder verwerking boom notasies. Onlangs het daar 'n opstanding van belangrikheid gewees in ongespesifiseerde verwerking, wat kan aangewys word a an die kombinasie van twee trende in die NLP gemeenskap: â\x80\x99n algemene trend teen ongespesifiseerde oefening of voor-oefening, en â\x80\x99n uitkommende trend teen die finking of modellering van lingvisse strukture in neurale modele. In hierdie onderwerp, sal ons voorstel aan die algemene publiek wat nie onderwerp verwerking doen en hoe dit kan bruikbaar wees vir en buite sintaktieke verwerking. Ons sal dan â\x80\x99n sistematiese oorskou van groot klasse van toegange verskaf na ononderwerp verwerking, naamlik genereerbare en diskriminasiewe toegange, en hulle relatiewe sterkte en swakhede analiseer. Ons sal beide dekadeoue statistiese toegang en meer onlangse neurale toegang oordek om die publiek 'n sens van die historiese en onlangse ontwikkeling van die veld te gee. Ons sal ook bespreek die uitkommende ondersoek onderwerpe soos BERT-gebaseerde toegang en visualiseerde onderwerp.", 'am': 'ያልተገለበጠው ማኅበረሰብ በዛፍ ማስታወቂያ ሳይኖር ክፍተቶችን ከማስተማር ተማረ፡፡ በቅርቢቱ ዘመን፣ በNLP ማኅበረሰብ ውስጥ ሁለት የውጤት ግንኙነትን ለመቀናቀል የሚችል የውጤት ማቀናቀል ወይም የፊተኛ ትምህርት ማቀናቀል፣ እና በአውጣው የቋንቋዊ መሠረት ማግኘት ወይም ምሳሌ ለመግኘት የሚችል የውጤት ግንኙነት አለበት፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት፣ ያልጠበቀው ማኅበረሰብ ምን እንደሆነ እናስጠቅማለን እና እንዴት ሊጠቅመው ይችላል፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ የባሕላዊ ደረጃዎች፣ የዘላለም እና የግንኙነት ደረጃዎች እና የአካባቢ ኃይላቸውንና ድካማቸውን እናስተምር፡፡ አሥር ዓመታት የነበረውን ተሳታፊዎች እና የቀድሞውን የሜሪቱን ታሪክ እና የቀድሞውን የአፍሪካዊ ግንኙነት ለመስጠት እናደርጋለን፡፡ እንደዚህ BERT-based ደረጃዎች እና የዓይነት መግለጫ እና የመራመሩትን ትምህርት እናነጋግራለን፡፡', 'sq': "Analizimi i pazgjidhur mëson një analizues sintaktik nga fjalët e stërvitjes pa analizuar anotacionet e pemës. Kohët e fundit, ka patur një ringjallje interesi në analizat e pazgjidhura, e cila mund të atribuohet kombinimit të dy prirjeve në komunitetin NLP: një prirje e përgjithshme drejt trajnimit të pazgjidhur apo paratrajnimit dhe një prirje në rritje drejt gjetjes apo modelimit të strukturave gjuhësore në modelet neurale. Në këtë mësim, do t'i prezantojmë publikut të përgjithshëm se çfarë bën analizimi i pa mbikqyrur dhe se si mund të jetë i dobishëm për dhe përtej analizimit sintaktik. Pastaj do të ofrojmë një përmbledhje sistematike të klasave të mëdha të qasjeve për analizimin e pa mbikqyrur, veçanërisht qasjeve gjenerative dhe diskriminuese dhe do të analizojmë fuqitë dhe dobësitë e tyre relative. Ne do t'i mbulojmë të dy qasjet statistike dekadë-vjeçare dhe qasjet më të fundit nervore për t'i dhënë publikut një ndjenjë të zhvillimit historik dhe të fundit të fushës. Do të diskutojmë gjithashtu temat e kërkimit të reja të tilla si qasjet me bazë në BERT dhe mësimin me bazë vizuale.", 'az': 'Ağac nöqtələrini ayırmadan sintaktik ayırıcı öyrənir. Son zamanlarda NLP toplumlarında iki trend birləşdirilməsinə təsirli olmayan təhsil və əvvəl təhsil etməyə təsirli olan, və nöral modellərdə dil yapılarını tapmaq və modellemək üçün yenidən təsirli təhsil edilən bir trend var. Bu öyrənməkdə, müəyyən edilməmiş ayırma və sintaktik ayırma üçün necə faydalı ola bilər? Sonra müəyyən edilməmiş ayırmaq üçün çox tərzlərin sistematik bir nəzər verəcəyik, nəzər verən və ayrı-ayrı tərzlərini analiz edəcəyik və onların qohum qüvvətlərini və zəifliklərini analiz edəcəyik. Biz on illərin yaşlı statistik tərzlərini və daha yeni nürol tərzlərini seçmək üçün seçənlərə alanın tarixi və son tərzlərini hiss edəcəyik. Beləliklə, BERT tabanlı tərzlərinə və görsel tərzlərinə görə öyrənmək kimi yenidən araşdırma məsələləri də mübahisə edəcəyik.', 'hy': 'Առանց վերահսկվող վերլուծությունը սովորում է սինտակտիկ վերլուծում ուսուցման նախադասություններից առանց վերլուծում ծառի նոտացիաների: Վերջերս հետաքրքրությունը վերածվել է անվերահսկված վերլուծության մեջ, որը կարող է պատասխանվել ՆԼՊ համայնքի երկու միտումների համակցությանը. ընդհանուր միտումն անվերահսկված կրթության կամ նախակրթության ուղղությամբ, և զարգացող միտումը գտնելու կամ մոդելավորելու լեզվական կառուցվածքները նյարդային Այս դասարանում մենք ընդհանուր հանդիսատեսին կներկայացնենք, թե ինչ է անում անվերահսկված վերլուծությունը և թե ինչպես կարող է այն օգտակար լինել սինտակտիկ վերլուծությունից դուրս: Այնուհետև մենք կտրամադրենք համակարգչային գերակշռություն անվերահսկված վերլուծության հիմնական մոտեցումների մասին, հատկապես սերունդային և խտրականության մոտեցումների մասին, և կվերլուծենք նրանց հարաբերական ուժերը և թույլությունները: Մենք կծախսենք երկու տասնամյակ տարեկան վիճակագրական մոտեցումներ և ավելի վերջին նյարդային մոտեցումներ, որպեսզի հանդիսատեսը հասկանա այս ոլորտի պատմական և վերջին զարգացումը: Մենք նաև կքննարկենք զարգացող ուսումնասիրության թեմաներ, ինչպիսիք են BER-ի հիմնված մոտեցումները և տեսողական հիմնված ուսումնասիրությունը:', 'bs': 'Neodređeno analiziranje nauči sintaktički analiziranje iz treninga rečenica bez analiziranja annotacija drveta. Nedavno je došlo do povratka interesa o neodređenom razmatranju, koja se može pripisati kombinaciji dva trend a u zajednici NLP-a: općem trenutku prema neodređenoj obuci ili predobuci, i pojavljujući trend prema pronalaženju ili modeliranju jezičkih struktura u neuralnim modelima. U ovom nastavniku predstavićemo generalnoj publiki ono što čini neodređeno analiziranje i kako može biti korisno za sintaktičko analiziranje i izvan toga. Onda ćemo pružiti sistematski pregled velikih razreda pristupa neodređenom razmatranju, a to je generativna i diskriminativna pristupa, i analizirati njihove relativne snage i slabosti. Pokrivaćemo i decenijalne statističke pristupe i nedavne neurološke pristupe kako bi publiki dali osjećaj istorijskog i nedavnog razvoja terena. Također ćemo razgovarati o novim istraživačkim temama poput pristupa na BERT-u i vizualno osnovanog učenja.', 'bn': 'Unsupervised parsing learns a syntactic parser from training sentences without parse tree annotations.  সম্প্রতি অরক্ষিত পার্গিং সম্পর্কে আগ্রহ পুনরায় উঠছে, যা এনএলপি সম্প্রদায়ের দুটি ধারাবাহিক সম্মুখীন হতে পারে: সংরক্ষিত প্রশিক্ষণ বা পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষণের প্রতি একটি সাধারণ ধারা এবং নিউরুল মডেলে  এই শিক্ষার্থীতে আমরা সাধারণ শ্রোতাদের সাথে পরিচয় করিয়ে দেব যে অরক্ষিত পার্গিং কি করে এবং কিভাবে সিন্ট্যাক্টিক পার্গিং এর বাইর তারপর আমরা সিস্টেমিক পর্যবেক্ষণ দেব অরক্ষিত পার্গিং এর প্রধান ক্লাসের সম্মুখীন সম্পর্কে, যেমন জেনারেটিভ এবং বৈষম্যিক উপায়, এবং তাদের আত্মীয় শক্তি এব আমরা দশকের পুরোনো পরিসংখ্যানের উপায় এবং সাম্প্রতিক নিউরাল কাছে প্রাপ্ত ক্ষেত্রের ঐতিহাসিক এবং সাম্প্রতিক উন্নয়নের অনুভূতি  এছাড়াও আমরা বিবার্ট ভিত্তিক ক্ষেত্র এবং দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি শিক্ষা নিয়ে গবেষণার বিষয় নিয়ে আলোচনা করব।', 'et': 'Järelevalveta parsimine õpib süntaktilist parserit treeninglausetest ilma parsimispuu annotatsioonideta. Viimasel ajal on huvi jälgimata parsimise vastu tõusnud, mida võib seostada kahe suundumusega uue õppekava kogukonnas: üldine suundumus järelevalveta koolitusele või eelkoolitusele ning tekkiv suundumus keelestruktuuride leidmisele või modelleerimisele närvimudelites. Selles õpetuses tutvustame üldisele publikule, mida järelevalveta parsimine teeb ja kuidas see võib olla kasulik süntaktilise parsimise jaoks ja väljaspool seda. Seejärel anname süstemaatilise ülevaate järelevalveta parsimise peamistest klassidest, nimelt generatiivsetest ja diskrimineerivatest lähenemisviisidest, ning analüüsime nende suhtelisi tugevusi ja nõrkusi. Me hõlmame nii kümnendivanuseid statistilisi lähenemisviise kui ka uuemaid neuraalseid lähenemisviise, et anda publikule aimu valdkonna ajaloolisest ja hiljutisest arengust. Arutame ka esilekerkivaid uurimisteemasid, nagu BERT-põhised lähenemisviisid ja visuaalselt põhjendatud õpe.', 'ca': "L'analització sense supervisió aprene un analitzador sinàctic a partir de frases d'entrenament sense anotacions d'arbre. Recentment, hi ha hagut un resurgiment d'interès en l'analització no supervisada, que pot ser atribuida a la combinació de dues tendències a la comunitat del NLP: una tendència general cap a una formació no supervisada o una pré-formació, i una tendència emergent cap a trobar o modelar estructures lingüístices en models neurals. En aquest tutorial, introduirem al públic general el que fa l'analització sense supervisió i com pot ser útil per i més enllà de l'analització sinàctica. Després proporcionarem una visió sistemàtica de les principals classes d'enfocaments a l'analització sense supervisió, a saber, enfocaments generadors i discriminatoris, i analitzarem les seves fortaleses i debilitats relativas. cobrirem els enfocaments estadístics de dècades i els enfocaments neuronals més recents per donar a l'audiència una idea del desenvolupament històric i recent del camp. També discutirem temes de recerca emergents com els enfocaments basats en BERT i l'aprenentatge visualment basat.", 'cs': 'Nepřehlížená analýza se učí syntaktický parser z tréninkových vět bez anotací parse stromu. V poslední době došlo k obnovení zájmu o analýzu bez dohledu, což lze připsat kombinaci dvou trendů v komunitě NLP: obecného trendu směrem k tréninku bez dohledu nebo předškolení a vznikajícího trendu k nalezení nebo modelování jazykových struktur v neuronových modelech. V tomto návodu představíme obecnému publiku, co bez dozoru parsing dělá a jak může být užitečné pro syntaktickou parsing i mimo ni. Následně poskytneme systematický přehled hlavních tříd přístupů k analýze bez dohledu, konkrétně generativních a diskriminačních přístupů, a analyzujeme jejich relativní silné a slabé stránky. Budeme pokrývat jak desetiletí staré statistické přístupy, tak i novější neuronové přístupy, abychom publiku poskytli pocit o historickém a nedávném vývoji oboru. Budeme také diskutovat o vznikajících výzkumných tématech, jako jsou přístupy založené na BERT a vizuálně zakotvené učení.', 'fi': 'Valvontaton jäsennys oppii syntaktisen jäsentäjän harjoittelemasta lauseita ilman jäsennyspuun huomautuksia. Viime aikoina on herännyt kiinnostus valvomattomaan jäsentämiseen, mikä johtuu kahden suuntauksen yhdistämisestä NLP-yhteisössä: yleinen suuntaus valvomattomaan koulutukseen tai esikoulutukseen ja nouseva suuntaus löytää tai mallintaa kielirakenteita neuromalleissa. Tässä opetusohjelmassa esittelemme yleisölle, mitä valvomaton parsaus tekee ja miten se voi olla hyödyllistä syntaktiseen parsaukseen ja sen ulkopuolelle. Tämän jälkeen annamme systemaattisen yleiskatsauksen valvomattoman jäsentämisen pääryhmistä eli generatiivisista ja syrjivistä lähestymistavoista ja analysoimme niiden suhteellisia vahvuuksia ja heikkouksia. Käsittelemme sekä vuosikymmeniä vanhoja tilastollisia lähestymistapoja että uudempia neurolähestymistapoja antaaksemme yleisölle käsityksen alan historiallisesta ja viimeaikaisesta kehityksestä. Keskustelemme myös uusista tutkimusaiheista, kuten BERT-pohjaisista lähestymistavoista ja visuaalisesti pohjautuvasta oppimisesta.', 'jv': 'Next %aDateFmt Neng dhéwé, kayané perusahaan nganggep sistem sing gak bener nggawe nguasai nggawe winih sing gak dhéwé, iki iso disenyongno karo segondè sampek duruha ning komunitas NLP Awak dhéwé éng tutorial iki, kita iso nggawe jewelité karo publik sing gak bener tentang karo perusahaan seneng nggawe lan ijol-ijol sing apik dhéwé. Name Saiki ono Awak dhéwé bakal segala macem dadi nggawe dolanan istatistik sing dumadhi ngono nggawe nguasai perbudhakan winih sing larang awak dhéwé nggawe nguasai tarjamahan lan nggawe nguasai perbudhakan winih. Awak dhéwé mangan kamulé perusahaan resmi sing paling nggawe gerakan kaya BERT lan mulasah sing nyimpen tur angel.', 'sk': 'Nenadzorovano razčlenjevanje se nauči sintaktičnega razčlenjevalnika iz vadbenih stavkov brez pripomb razčlenjevanja drevesa. V zadnjem času se je ponovno pojavilo zanimanje za nenadzorovano razčlenitev, kar je mogoče pripisati kombinaciji dveh trendov v skupnosti NLP: splošnega trenda k nenadzorovanemu usposabljanju ali predusposabljanju ter nastajajočega trenda k iskanju ali modeliranju jezikovnih struktur v nevronskih modelih. V tej vadnici bomo splošnemu občinstvu predstavili, kaj počne nenadzorovano razčlenjevanje in kako je lahko koristno za sintaktično razčlenjevanje. Nato bomo zagotovili sistematičen pregled glavnih razredov pristopov k nenadzorovanemu razčlenjevanju, in sicer generativnih in diskriminativnih pristopov, ter analizirali njihove relativne prednosti in slabosti. Obravnavali bomo tako desetletne statistične pristope kot novejše nevronske pristope, da bi občinstvu dali občutek zgodovinskega in nedavnega razvoja tega področja. Razpravljali bomo tudi o nastajajočih raziskovalnih temah, kot so pristopi na podlagi BERT-a in vizualno utemeljeno učenje.', 'he': 'Unsupervised parsing learns a syntactic parser from training sentences without parse tree annotations.  Recently, there has been a resurgence of interest in unsupervised parsing, which can be attributed to the combination of two trends in the NLP community: a general trend towards unsupervised training or pre-training, and an emerging trend towards finding or modeling linguistic structures in neural models.  במדרון הזה, אנחנו נציג לקהל הכללי מה מערכת חקירה ללא השגחה עושה ואיך זה יכול להיות שימושי עבור ולמעבר לאבחן סינטקטי. We will then provide a systematic overview of major classes of approaches to unsupervised parsing, namely generative and discriminative approaches, and analyze their relative strengths and weaknesses.  אנחנו נכסה את הגישויים הסטטיסטיים של עשרות שנים וגישויים עצביים יותר לאחרונה כדי לתת לקהל תחושה של התפתחות היסטורית ואחרונה של השטח. We will also discuss emerging research topics such as BERT-based approaches and visually grounded learning.', 'bo': 'Unsupervised parsing learns a syntactic parser from training sentences without parse tree annotations. འཕྲལ་མ་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་གི་མིག་སྔར་བསྐྱོད་མེད་པའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་གི་རྐྱེན་ཚུལ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་རྩིས་གཞུང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་བྱ་སྤྱོད་མེད་པའི་རྣམ་པ་མཉམ་དུ་སྤྲོད་དགོས་མིན་པའི་དཔོན་རིགས་ལ། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡུལ་མེད་པའི་མིང་རྟགས་བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཆེད་དུ་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མི་རྣམས་ལས་ཕན་ཚུལ་ཞིབ་འཇུག ང་ཚོས་གཞི་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་མཉམ་ལས་བརྗོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་དཔོན་རྣམས་ལ་མཐོང་ནི་ལོ་རྒྱུས་དང་གསར་ཤོས་ཀྱི་འཕེལ་ར ང་ཚོས་BERT་ལྟ་བུའི་མཐོང་སྣང་དང་ལྟ་བུའི་རྨན་པར་མཐོང་བའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཁོངས་བཤད་དགོས།', 'ha': "@ action: button A yanzu, akwai wata fara na riba ga parse da ba'a tsare shi ba, which can be attitũ da kombinta biyu na hanyõyi cikin jamii NLP: wata taga ta gaba ɗaya zuwa tsarin da aka tsare shi ko na zaman tsari, kuma wata na sami zuwa ga kuta ko sami tsarin linguistic cikin misãlai na neura. Daga wannan tudun, zã mu gaya wa mai yawan saurari da abin da parse na tsare shi ke aikata kuma yadda zai iya amfani da shi ga parse mai syntactic. Sa'an nan kuma zã Mu ba da wani surfato na masu kamfata matsayin mazaunin da ba'a tsare shi ba, masu dangantar da masu dangantarwa da yin gauraya, kuma zã Mu yi anadi ga ƙarfin dangantarsu da rauni. We will cover both decade-old statistical approaches and more recent neural approaches to give the audience a sense of the historical and recent development of the field.  Za sami zã mu yi jayayya da madaidaita masu ƙidãya kamar manyan hanyõyin BERT da barci na gane."}
{'en': 'Aggregating and Learning from Multiple Annotators', 'ar': 'التجميع والتعلم من العديد من التعليقات التوضيحية', 'es': 'Agregar y aprender de varios anotadores', 'fr': 'Agrégation et apprentissage à partir de plusieurs annotateurs', 'pt': 'Agregando e aprendendo com vários anotadores', 'hi': 'एकाधिक Annotators से एकत्रित और सीखना', 'ja': '複数のアノテーターからの集約と学習', 'zh': '聚学数注器', 'ru': 'Агрегирование и обучение с помощью нескольких аннотаторов', 'ga': 'Comhiomlánú agus Foghlaim ó Mhódóirí Iolracha', 'hu': 'Összesítés és tanulás több kommentátorból', 'ka': 'მრავალ ანოტოტორიებისგან შესწავლობა და სწავლობა', 'it': 'Aggregare e imparare da più annotatori', 'kk': 'Бірнеше жазбалардан біріктіру және оқыту', 'mk': 'Грегирање и учење од повеќе анотатори', 'lt': 'Sujungimas ir mokymasis iš kelių anotatorių', 'el': 'Συγκέντρωση και μάθηση από πολλαπλούς σχολιαστές', 'ms': 'Menggabung dan Belajar dari Pelbagai Annotator', 'mt': 'Aggregazzjoni u Tagħlim minn Annotaturi Multipli', 'ml': 'Multiple Annotators', 'mn': 'Бидний олон анзаарагчдын нэгдэл болон суралцах', 'no': 'Aggrerering og læring frå fleire merknader', 'ro': 'Agregarea și învățarea de la mai mulți adnotatori', 'pl': 'Agregowanie i uczenie się z wielu adnotatorów', 'sr': 'Okupljanje i učenje od višestrukih Annotatora', 'so': 'Waxbarashada iyo waxbarashada', 'si': 'ගොඩක් ඇන්ටෝටර් වලින් සංවිධානය සහ ඉගෙනගන්න', 'ta': 'பல அறிவிப்பாளர்களிலிருந்து ஒன்று சேர்த்தல் மற்றும் கற்றல்', 'sv': 'Aggregera och lära av flera kommentatorer', 'ur': 'MultiAnnotators سے جمع اور سیکھنے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tập hợp và học từ Nhiều chú thích', 'bg': 'Агрегиране и учене от множество анотатори', 'da': 'Samling og læring af flere kommentatorer', 'hr': 'Okupljanje i učenje od višestrukih annotatora', 'nl': 'Samenvoegen en leren van meerdere annotatoren', 'de': 'Aggregieren und Lernen von mehreren Kommentatoren', 'ko': '여러 주석기에서 모으고 배우기', 'id': 'Berkumpul dan Belajar dari Beberapa Annotator', 'sw': 'Kuunganisha na kujifunza kutoka matangazo mengi', 'fa': 'جمع کردن و یادگیری از چند نویسنده\u200cها', 'tr': 'Çoklu Annotatorden birleşme ve öğrenme', 'sq': 'Aggregating and Learning from Multiple Annotators', 'af': 'Versameling en leer van Veelvuldige Opmerkers', 'am': 'CategoryName', 'bn': 'Multiple Annotator থেকে গ্রেগ্রেটিং এবং শিক্ষা', 'hy': 'Համագրելով և սովորելով բազմաթիվ նատորատորներից', 'cs': 'Agregování a učení se z více anotátorů', 'az': '√áoxlu Annotatorlardan birl…ôŇüdirm…ôk v…ô √∂yr…ônm…ôk', 'et': 'Mitme annotatori koondamine ja õppimine', 'fi': 'Yhdistäminen ja oppiminen useista huomautuksista', 'bs': 'Okupljanje i učenje od višestrukih Annotatora', 'ca': 'Agregar i aprendre de múltiples anotators', 'he': 'התאספו וללמד ממספר נוטטורים', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'sk': 'Združevanje in učenje z več opozorilniki', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ཚོར་འབྲེལ་བ་སྣ་ཚོགས་ལ་སྔར་སྒྲིག་དང་ཤེས་འཇུག་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'The success of NLP research is founded on high-quality annotated datasets, which are usually obtained from multiple expert annotators or crowd workers. The standard practice to training machine learning models is to first adjudicate the disagreements and then perform the training. To this end, there has been a lot of work on aggregating annotations, particularly for classification tasks. However, many other tasks, particularly in NLP, have unique characteristics not considered by standard models of annotation, e.g., label interdependencies in sequence labelling tasks, unrestricted labels for anaphoric annotation, or preference labels for ranking texts. In recent years, researchers have picked up on this and are covering the gap. A first objective of this tutorial is to connect NLP researchers with state-of-the-art aggregation models for a diverse set of canonical language annotation tasks. There is also a growing body of recent work arguing that following the convention and training with adjudicated labels ignores any uncertainty the labellers had in their classifications, which results in models with poorer generalisation capabilities. Therefore, a second objective of this tutorial is to teach NLP workers how they can augment their (deep) neural models to learn from data with multiple interpretations.', 'es': 'El éxito de la investigación de PNL se basa en conjuntos de datos anotados de alta calidad, que generalmente se obtienen de múltiples anotadores expertos o trabajadores de masas. La práctica estándar para entrenar modelos de aprendizaje automático es primero resolver los desacuerdos y luego realizar la capacitación. Con este fin, se ha trabajado mucho en la agregación de anotaciones, en particular para las tareas de clasificación. Sin embargo, muchas otras tareas, particularmente en PNL, tienen características únicas que los modelos estándar de anotación no tienen en cuenta, por ejemplo, las interdependencias de etiquetas en las tareas de etiquetado de secuencias, las etiquetas sin restricciones para la anotación anafórica o las etiquetas de preferencia para los textos de clasificación. En los últimos años, los investigadores se han dado cuenta de esto y están cubriendo la brecha. Un primer objetivo de este tutorial es conectar a los investigadores de PNL con modelos de agregación de última generación para un conjunto diverso de tareas de anotación de lenguaje canónico. También hay un creciente cuerpo de trabajo reciente que sostiene que seguir la convención y la capacitación con etiquetas adjudicadas ignora cualquier incertidumbre que los etiquetadores tuvieran en sus clasificaciones, lo que resulta en modelos con capacidades de generalización más pobres. Por lo tanto, un segundo objetivo de este tutorial es enseñar a los trabajadores de PNL cómo pueden aumentar sus modelos neuronales (profundos) para aprender de los datos con múltiples interpretaciones.', 'pt': 'O sucesso da pesquisa de PNL é baseado em conjuntos de dados anotados de alta qualidade, que geralmente são obtidos de vários anotadores especialistas ou trabalhadores de multidões. A prática padrão para treinar modelos de aprendizado de máquina é primeiro julgar as divergências e depois realizar o treinamento. Para este fim, tem havido muito trabalho na agregação de anotações, particularmente para tarefas de classificação. No entanto, muitas outras tarefas, particularmente em PNL, têm características únicas não consideradas pelos modelos padrão de anotação, por exemplo, interdependências de rótulos em tarefas de rotulagem de sequência, rótulos irrestritos para anotação anafórica ou rótulos de preferência para classificação de textos. Nos últimos anos, os pesquisadores perceberam isso e estão cobrindo a lacuna. Um primeiro objetivo deste tutorial é conectar pesquisadores de PNL com modelos de agregação de última geração para um conjunto diversificado de tarefas de anotação de linguagem canônica. Há também um crescente corpo de trabalhos recentes argumentando que seguir a convenção e o treinamento com rótulos adjudicados ignora qualquer incerteza que os rotuladores tinham em suas classificações, o que resulta em modelos com menor capacidade de generalização. Portanto, um segundo objetivo deste tutorial é ensinar aos profissionais de PNL como eles podem aumentar seus modelos neurais (profundos) para aprender com dados com múltiplas interpretações.', 'ar': 'تأسس نجاح أبحاث البرمجة اللغوية العصبية على مجموعات بيانات مشروحة عالية الجودة ، والتي يتم الحصول عليها عادةً من العديد من المعلقين الخبراء أو العاملين الجماعيين. الممارسة القياسية لتدريب نماذج التعلم الآلي هي الفصل في الخلافات أولاً ثم إجراء التدريب. تحقيقا لهذه الغاية ، كان هناك الكثير من العمل على تجميع التعليقات التوضيحية ، خاصة لمهام التصنيف. ومع ذلك ، فإن العديد من المهام الأخرى ، لا سيما في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية ، لها خصائص فريدة لا تراعيها النماذج القياسية للتعليقات التوضيحية ، على سبيل المثال ، التبعيات المتبادلة في مهام وضع العلامات على التسلسل ، أو التسميات غير المقيدة للتعليق التوضيحي ، أو تسميات التفضيل لنصوص الترتيب. في السنوات الأخيرة ، التقط الباحثون هذا الأمر وقاموا بتغطية الفجوة. يتمثل الهدف الأول لهذا البرنامج التعليمي في توصيل باحثي البرمجة اللغوية العصبية بأحدث نماذج التجميع لمجموعة متنوعة من مهام التعليقات التوضيحية اللغوية الأساسية. هناك أيضًا مجموعة متزايدة من الأعمال الحديثة التي تجادل بأن اتباع الاتفاقية والتدريب باستخدام الملصقات التي تم الفصل فيها يتجاهل أي عدم يقين لدى واضعي الملصقات في تصنيفاتهم ، مما يؤدي إلى نماذج ذات قدرات تعميم أضعف. لذلك ، الهدف الثاني من هذا البرنامج التعليمي هو تعليم العاملين في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية كيف يمكنهم زيادة نماذجهم العصبية (العميقة) للتعلم من البيانات ذات التفسيرات المتعددة.', 'fr': "Le succès de la recherche sur la PNL repose sur des ensembles de données annotés de haute qualité, qui sont généralement obtenus auprès de plusieurs annotateurs experts ou de travailleurs participatifs. La pratique standard pour former des modèles d'apprentissage automatique consiste d'abord à trancher les désaccords, puis à effectuer la formation. À cette fin, de nombreux travaux ont été consacrés à l'agrégation des annotations, en particulier pour les tâches de classification. Cependant, de nombreuses autres tâches, en particulier dans la PNL, présentent des caractéristiques uniques qui ne sont pas prises en compte par les modèles standard d'annotation, par exemple, les interdépendances entre étiquettes dans les tâches d'étiquetage de séquence, les étiquettes non restreintes pour les annotations anaphoriques ou les étiquettes de préférence pour les textes de classement. Au cours des dernières années, les chercheurs se sont penchés sur ce point et ont comblé le fossé. Un premier objectif de ce tutoriel est de connecter les chercheurs en PNL avec des modèles d'agrégation de pointe pour un ensemble diversifié de tâches d'annotation de langage canonique. Il existe également un nombre croissant de travaux récents affirmant que le respect de la convention et la formation avec des étiquettes jugées ignorent toute incertitude que les étiqueteurs avaient dans leurs classifications, ce qui se traduit par des modèles dotés de capacités de généralisation plus faibles. Par conséquent, un deuxième objectif de ce tutoriel est d'enseigner aux travailleurs de la PNL comment ils peuvent augmenter leurs modèles neuronaux (profonds) pour apprendre à partir de données avec des interprétations multiples.", 'zh': 'NLP治成立于高质量注数据集之上,常自数家注释者或人群工作者。 教机器法者,先断分歧而后教之。 为之总注,特于分类,多所施为。 然多他务,特在NLP中,有准注模形未虑者,如序标相依赖性,施于无限注与排名文本首选项。 近年以来,治人已知之矣,方补其差。 本教程首将 NLP 人与先进合模形,以成其异。 近者益多,以为循例裁决商在忽于分不确定性,此泛化力劣也。 故本教程二者,教也NLP工作者所以强其(深)神经,以学于众说之数也。', 'ja': 'NLP研究の成功は、通常、複数の専門家の注釈者またはクラウドワーカーから得られる高品質の注釈付きデータセットに基づいています。 機械学習モデルをトレーニングするための標準的な慣行は、まず意見の相違を裁定し、その後トレーニングを実施することです。 このために、特に分類タスクのために、注釈の集約に多くの作業がありました。 しかしながら、特にNLPにおける多くの他のタスクは、標準的な注釈モデルによって考慮されない独自の特徴、例えば、配列ラベリングタスクにおけるラベル相互依存性、類似の注釈のための無制限のラベル、またはテキストをランク付けするための優先ラベルを有する。 近年、研究者がこれを拾い上げ、そのギャップをカバーしている。 このチュートリアルの最初の目的は、NLP研究者を、多様な一連の正準言語注釈タスクのための最先端の集約モデルと結びつけることです。 最近の研究の主体も増えてきており、ラベルを裁定したコンベンションとトレーニングに従うことは、ラベルを扱う者が分類に持っていた不確実性を無視し、結果としてより一般化能力の低いモデルを生み出すと主張している。 したがって、このチュートリアルの第2の目的は、NLP労働者が（深い）ニューラルモデルを拡張して、複数の解釈でデータから学習する方法を教えることである。', 'ru': 'Успех исследования NLP основан на высококачественных аннотированных наборах данных, которые обычно получают от нескольких экспертных аннотаторов или крауд-работников. Стандартная практика обучения моделям машинного обучения заключается в том, чтобы сначала разрешить разногласия, а затем провести обучение. С этой целью была проделана большая работа по агрегированию аннотаций, особенно для задач классификации. Однако многие другие задачи, особенно в NLP, имеют уникальные характеристики, не учитываемые стандартными моделями аннотации, например, взаимозависимости меток в задачах маркировки последовательностей, неограниченные метки для анафорической аннотации или предпочтительные метки для ранжирования текстов. В последние годы исследователи ухватились за это и восполняют этот пробел. Первая цель этого руководства состоит в том, чтобы соединить исследователей NLP с самыми современными моделями агрегации для разнообразного набора задач аннотации канонического языка. Существует также растущий объем недавней работы, утверждая, что следование конвенции и обучение с подтвержденными судами ярлыками игнорирует любую неопределенность, имеющуюся у продавцов этикеток в их классификациях, что приводит к моделям с более низкими возможностями обобщения. Следовательно, вторая цель этого учебника - научить работников NLP тому, как они могут расширить свои (глубокие) нейронные модели, чтобы учиться на данных с множественной интерпретацией.', 'hi': 'एनएलपी अनुसंधान की सफलता उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले एनोटेटेड डेटासेट पर आधारित है, जो आमतौर पर कई विशेषज्ञ एनोटेटर या भीड़ श्रमिकों से प्राप्त की जाती है। मशीन लर्निंग मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए मानक अभ्यास पहले असहमति का निर्णय लेना और फिर प्रशिक्षण करना है। इस अंत के लिए, विशेष रूप से वर्गीकरण कार्यों के लिए एनोटेशन को एकत्रित करने पर बहुत काम किया गया है। हालांकि, कई अन्य कार्यों, विशेष रूप से एनएलपी में, अद्वितीय विशेषताएं हैं जो एनोटेशन के मानक मॉडल द्वारा नहीं मानी जाती हैं, उदाहरण के लिए, अनुक्रम लेबलिंग कार्यों में परस्पर निर्भरता, एनाफोरिक एनोटेशन के लिए अप्रतिबंधित लेबल, या रैंकिंग ग्रंथों के लिए वरीयता लेबल। हाल के वर्षों में, शोधकर्ताओं ने इस पर उठाया है और अंतर को कवर कर रहे हैं। इस ट्यूटोरियल का पहला उद्देश्य एनएलपी शोधकर्ताओं को विहित भाषा एनोटेशन कार्यों के विविध सेट के लिए अत्याधुनिक एकत्रीकरण मॉडल के साथ जोड़ना है। हाल के काम का एक बढ़ता हुआ शरीर भी है, जिसमें तर्क दिया गया है कि निर्णायक लेबल के साथ सम्मेलन और प्रशिक्षण के बाद लेबलरों के वर्गीकरण में किसी भी अनिश्चितता की अनदेखी की जाती है, जिसके परिणामस्वरूप खराब सामान्यीकरण क्षमताओं वाले मॉडल होते हैं। इसलिए, इस ट्यूटोरियल का एक दूसरा उद्देश्य एनएलपी श्रमिकों को सिखाना है कि वे कई व्याख्याओं के साथ डेटा से सीखने के लिए अपने (गहरे) तंत्रिका मॉडल को कैसे बढ़ा सकते हैं।', 'ga': 'Tá rathúlacht thaighde NLP bunaithe ar thacair shonraí anótáilte ardchaighdeáin, a fhaightear de ghnáth ó anótálaithe iolracha nó ó shlu-oibrithe. Is é an cleachtas caighdeánach chun samhlacha meaisínfhoghlama a oiliúint ná na heasaontais a bhreithniú ar dtús agus ansin an oiliúint a dhéanamh. Chuige sin, tá go leor oibre déanta ar nótaí a chomhbhailiú, go háirithe do thascanna rangaithe. Mar sin féin, tá tréithe uathúla ag go leor tascanna eile, go háirithe i NLP, nach mbreathnaítear orthu i múnlaí caighdeánacha anótála, m.sh. idirspleáchas lipéad i dtascanna lipéadaithe seichimh, lipéid neamhshrianta le haghaidh nóta anafórach, nó lipéid tosaíochta le haghaidh téacsanna rangaithe. Le blianta beaga anuas, tá taighdeoirí tar éis dul i ngleic leis seo agus tá siad ag clúdach na bearna. Is é ceann de na chéad chuspóirí den rang teagaisc seo taighdeoirí NLP a nascadh le samhlacha comhiomlánaithe den scoth le haghaidh sraith éagsúil de thascanna anótála teanga chanónacha. Tá obair ag dul i méid le déanaí freisin ag áitiú go ndéanann tar éis an chomhghnáis agus na hoiliúna le lipéid bhreithnithe neamhaird ar aon éiginnteacht a bhí ag na lipéadóirí ina n-aicmithe, rud a fhágann go mbíonn samhlacha le cumas ginearálaithe níos boichte. Mar sin, is é dara cuspóir an teagaisc seo ná oibrithe NLP a mhúineadh conas is féidir leo a gcuid samhlacha néaracha (domhain) a mhéadú chun foghlaim ó shonraí le léirmhínithe iolracha.', 'el': 'Η επιτυχία της έρευνας βασίζεται σε υψηλής ποιότητας σχολιασμένα σύνολα δεδομένων, τα οποία συνήθως λαμβάνονται από πολλούς ειδικούς σχολιαστές ή εργαζόμενους στο πλήθος. Η συνήθης πρακτική για την εκπαίδευση μοντέλων μηχανικής μάθησης είναι να κρίνουν πρώτα τις διαφωνίες και στη συνέχεια να εκτελούν την εκπαίδευση. Για το σκοπό αυτό, έχει γίνει πολλή εργασία για τη συγκέντρωση σχολίων, ιδίως για εργασίες ταξινόμησης. Ωστόσο, πολλές άλλες εργασίες, ιδιαίτερα στο ΝLP, έχουν μοναδικά χαρακτηριστικά που δεν λαμβάνονται υπόψη από τα τυποποιημένα μοντέλα σχολιασμού, π.χ. αλληλεξάρτηση ετικετών σε εργασίες επισήμανσης ακολουθίας, απεριόριστες ετικέτες για αναφορικό σχολιασμό ή ετικέτες προτίμησης για κείμενα κατάταξης. Τα τελευταία χρόνια, ερευνητές το κατάλαβαν αυτό και καλύπτουν το κενό. Ένας πρώτος στόχος αυτού του μαθήματος είναι να συνδέσει τους ερευνητές με τα σύγχρονα μοντέλα συγκέντρωσης για ένα ποικίλο σύνολο κανονικών εργασιών σχολιασμού γλωσσών. Υπάρχει επίσης ένα αυξανόμενο σύνολο πρόσφατων εργασιών που υποστηρίζουν ότι η παρακολούθηση της σύμβασης και η κατάρτιση με επικυρωμένες ετικέτες αγνοεί κάθε αβεβαιότητα που είχαν οι επισήμαντες στις ταξινομήσεις τους, γεγονός που οδηγεί σε μοντέλα με λιγότερες δυνατότητες γενικοποίησης. Ως εκ τούτου, ένας δεύτερος στόχος αυτού του μαθήματος είναι να διδάξει στους εργαζόμενους πώς μπορούν να αυξήσουν τα (βαθιά) νευρωνικά μοντέλα τους για να μάθουν από δεδομένα με πολλαπλές ερμηνείες.', 'hu': 'Az NLP kutatások sikere a kiváló minőségű jegyzetelt adatkészleteken alapul, amelyeket általában több szakértő jegyzetelőtől vagy tömegmunkástól kapnak. A gépi tanulási modellek képzésének szokásos gyakorlata először a nézeteltérések elbírálása, majd a képzés elvégzése. Ennek érdekében sok munka történt a jegyzetek összesítésével, különösen az osztályozási feladatok esetében. Számos más feladatnak azonban, különösen a NLP-ben, olyan egyedi jellemzőkkel rendelkeznek, amelyeket a szabványos jegyzetmodellek nem vesznek figyelembe, mint például a címkék kölcsönös függősége a sorozatcímkézési feladatokban, korlátlan címkék anafórikus jegyzetmegjegyzéshez, vagy a rangsorolási szövegek preferenciájához. Az elmúlt években a kutatók észrevették ezt, és fedezik a hiányt. A bemutató első célja, hogy összekapcsolja az NLP kutatóit a legkorszerűbb aggregációs modellekkel a kanonikus nyelvi jegyzetelési feladatok különböző sorozatához. A közelmúltbeli munkák egyre nagyobb része is azzal érvel, hogy az egyezményt követően és a bírósági címkékkel történő képzést figyelmen kívül hagyja minden bizonytalanságot a címkézők osztályozásában, ami rosszabb általánosítási képességű modelleket eredményez. Ezért ennek a bemutatónak a második célja, hogy megtanítsa az NLP dolgozókat, hogyan tudják bővíteni (mély) neurális modelleiket, hogy többféle értelmezéssel tanuljanak az adatokból.', 'ka': 'NLP პასუხის წარმატება უფრო მეტი კანოტიური მონაცემების კონტაქტიდან იქნება, რომელიც უფრო მეტი ექსპერტის ანოტუტირების ანოტუტირებისგან იქნება. სტანდარტური პრაქტიკა მაქინის სწავლების მოდელებისთვის არის პირველი გადაწყვეტა განსხვავებას და შემდეგ განსხვავებას. ამ კონფიგურაციისთვის ბევრი სამუშაო მოქმედება, განსაკუთრებით კლასიფიკაციის დავალებისთვის. მაგრამ ბევრი სხვა დავალებები, განსაკუთრებით NLP-ში, აქვს უნიკალური განსაკუთრებულები, რომლებიც ანოტური ანოტური ანოტური ანოტური ანოტური ანოტური ანოტური ტექსტის განსაკუთრებულების სტანდარტური მოდელებით, მაგა ოჲჟლვენთრვ დჲეთნთ ოჲჟლვენთრვ პაჱჟლვეგაფკთ დჲ ოპვკპთგაარ ჲგა. ამ სტუტორიის პირველი მიზეზი არის NLP მსწავლობელების დაკავშირება განსხვავებული კანონიკური ენის ანოტაციის მოდელებით. მხოლოდ ახალი სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო იქნება, რომელიც შემდეგ კონგენცია და განაკეთება ახალგაზრულებული ლაბეტებით იცნოდნენ ყველა უცნობიერება, რომელიც ლაბეტებელების კლასიფი ამიტომ, ამ სტუალური მეორე მიზეზი არის NLP სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო, როგორ შეუძლებელიან გავაკეთოთ სამუშაო ნეიროლური მოდელები, რომ მონაწილეებიდან', 'it': "Il successo della ricerca NLP si basa su set di dati annotati di alta qualità, che di solito sono ottenuti da più esperti annotatori o crowdworker. La pratica standard per formare modelli di apprendimento automatico è prima di giudicare i disaccordi e poi eseguire la formazione. A tal fine, si è lavorato molto sull'aggregazione delle annotazioni, in particolare per le attività di classificazione. Tuttavia, molti altri compiti, in particolare nel PNL, presentano caratteristiche uniche non considerate dai modelli standard di annotazione, ad esempio interdipendenze di etichette nelle attività di etichettatura sequenziale, etichette illimitate per annotazioni anaforiche o etichette preferenziali per i testi di classificazione. Negli ultimi anni, i ricercatori hanno colto questo aspetto e stanno coprendo il divario. Un primo obiettivo di questo tutorial è quello di collegare i ricercatori NLP con modelli di aggregazione all'avanguardia per una serie diversificata di attività di annotazione del linguaggio canonico. C'è anche un crescente numero di lavori recenti che sostengono che seguendo la convenzione e la formazione con etichette giudicate ignorano qualsiasi incertezza che gli etichettatori avevano nelle loro classificazioni, il che si traduce in modelli con scarse capacità di generalizzazione. Pertanto, un secondo obiettivo di questo tutorial è quello di insegnare ai lavoratori NLP come possono aumentare i loro modelli neurali (profondi) per imparare dai dati con interpretazioni multiple.", 'kk': 'NLP зерттеулерінің сәттілігі көпшілікті белгіленген деректер қорларында орнатылады. Әдетте олар көпшілікті жаңалықтардан немесе көпшілікті жұмыстардан алынады. Компьютерді оқыту үлгілерінің стандартты практикасы - біріншіден келістіктерді шешу және оқыту үлгілерін орындау. Бұл соңында, жазбаларды жұмыс істеу үшін көп жұмыс істеді, әсіресе классификациялық тапсырмалар үшін. Бірақ басқа тапсырмалардың көпшілігі, әсіресе NLP- де, стандартты жазбалар үлгілеріне сәйкес етілмеген, мысалы, реттеу тапсырмалардың арасындағы тәуелсіздіктері, анафориялық жазбалар үшін шектелмеген жарлықтар неме Соңғы жылдарда зерттеушілер осыны таптып, бос орындарды жасырып жатыр. Бұл оқытудың бірінші мақсаты - NLP зерттеушілерін әртүрлі каноникалық тілдердің оқыту тапсырмаларымен қосылу. Сонымен қатар, жаңа жұмыс белгілерінің конвенциясы мен оқытуы келесі жарлықтардың классификациясында жарлықтардың кез келген тәуелсіздігін елемейді. Бұл үлгілердің үлгілері жалпы жалпы жалпы жалпы бол Сондықтан, осы оқыту үшін екінші мақсат NLP жұмыстарын бірнеше толыққан деректерден оқыту үшін (терең) невралдық моделдерін қалай көтеруге болады.', 'mk': 'The success of NLP research is founded on high-quality annotated datasets, which are usually obtained from multiple expert annotators or crowd workers.  Стандардната практика за обука на моделите на машинско учење е прво да се суди на несогласувањата и потоа да се изврши обуката. За оваа цел, имаше многу работа на агрегирање на анотациите, особено за класификациските задачи. However, many other tasks, particularly in NLP, have unique characteristics not considered by standard models of annotation, e.g., label interdependencies in sequence labelling tasks, unrestricted labels for anaphoric annotation, or preference labels for ranking texts.  Во последниве години истражувачите го сфатија ова и го покриваат јазот. Прва цел на овој наставник е да ги поврзува истражувачите на НЛП со најсовремените модели на агрегација за различни задачи за анатација на каноничкиот јазик. Исто така, постои растечко тело на неодамнешна работа тврдејќи дека по конвенцијата и обуката со осудени етикети се игнорира секоја несигурност што ги имаа етикетите во нивните класификации, што резултира со модели со полоши генерализациски способности. Затоа, втората цел на овој наставник е да ги научи работниците на НЛП како можат да ги зголемат нивните (длабоки) нервни модели за да научат од податоци со повеќе интерпретации.', 'ms': 'Keberjayaan kajian NLP didasarkan pada set data yang berkualiti tinggi yang dicatat, yang biasanya diperoleh dari beberapa pengarang pakar atau pekerja ramai. Praktik piawai untuk melatih model pembelajaran mesin adalah untuk pertama menilai ketidaksetujuan dan kemudian melakukan latihan. To this end, there has been a lot of work on aggregating annotations, particularly for classification tasks.  Namun, banyak tugas lain, terutamanya dalam NLP, mempunyai ciri-ciri unik yang tidak dianggap oleh model piawai anotasi, cth., interdependensi label dalam tugas penandaan jujukan, label tidak terbatas untuk anotasi anaforik, atau label keutamaan untuk penandaan teks. Selama bertahun-tahun terakhir, peneliti telah menerima hal ini dan sedang menutupi ruang. Objektif pertama tutorial ini adalah menyambungkan penyelidik NLP dengan model agregasi state-of-the-art untuk set berbeza tugas anotasi bahasa canonical. Terdapat juga tumbuh tubuh kerja baru-baru ini berdebat bahawa mengikut konvensi dan latihan dengan label yang ditandai mengabaikan mana-mana ketidakpastian yang labeler mempunyai dalam klasifikasi mereka, yang mengakibatkan model dengan kemampuan generalisasi yang lebih buruk. Oleh itu, tujuan kedua dalam tutorial ini ialah mengajar pekerja NLP bagaimana mereka boleh menambah model saraf (dalam) mereka untuk belajar dari data dengan interpretasi berbilang.', 'ml': 'എംഎല്\u200dപി പഠനത്തിന്റെ വിജയം ഉയര്\u200dത്തുന്ന ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാപിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് സാധാരണ പല വിശേഷിപ്പിക്ക മോഡല്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ സാധാരണ പരിശീലം ആദ്യം വിവ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതും പിന്നെ പരിശീല ഈ അവസാനത്തിനു വേണ്ടി ഒരുപാട് ജോലി ഉണ്ടായിരുന്നു, പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക്. However, many other tasks, particularly in NLP, have unique characteristics not considered by standard models of annotation, e.g., label interdependencies in sequence labelling tasks, unrestricted labels for anaphoric annotation, or preference labels for ranking texts.  കഴിഞ്ഞ വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളില്\u200d പരിശീലന്\u200dമാര്\u200d ഇതില്\u200d പിടിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുകയാണ് വേര്\u200dതിരിക്കുന്നത്. ഈ ട്യൂട്ടറിയലിന്റെ ആദ്യത്തെ ലക്ഷ്യം എന്\u200dഎല്\u200dപി പരിശീലിക്കുന്നവരെ സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓ- കലാര്\u200dട്ട് മോഡലുകളുമായി ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതാണ്.  അടുത്ത പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ശരീരം കൂടിയിരിക്കുന്നുവെന്ന് വാദിക്കുന്നു, കോണ്\u200dണെന്\u200dഷനും പരിശീലനത്തിനും കീഴ്പെടുത്തിയ ലേബിലുകളുടെ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന അതുകൊണ്ട്, ഈ വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ രണ്ടാമത്തെ ലക്ഷ്യം NLP ജോലിക്കാരെ പഠിപ്പിക്കാനാണ് അവര്\u200dക്ക് എങ്ങനെ അവരുടെ (ആഴത്തില്\u200d) പ്ര', 'mn': 'NLP судалгааны амжилтыг олон мэргэжилтнүүд эсвэл олон нийгмийн ажилтнуудаас авч ирдэг өндөр чанартай өгөгдлийн санд байгуулсан. Машин суралцах загварын стандарт дасгал нь анх зөрчилдөөнийг шалгаж, дараа нь суралцах юм. Энэ төгсгөлд анзаарлыг нийлүүлэхэд маш олон ажил байлаа. Ялангуяа анзаарлын ажлын тухай. Гэхдээ өөр олон ажил, ялангуяа NLP-д, стандарт анзаарлын загвараар үзэхгүй, жишээлбэл дарааллын маркетингийн ажил, анзаарлын анзаарлын анзаарлын анзаарлын анзаарлын анзаарлын анзаарлын анзаарлын анзаарлын анзаарлын анзаарлын etiketүүд байдаг. Сүүлийн жилийн дотор судлаачид үүнийг авч, ялгааг нээж байна. Энэ сургалтын анхны зорилго нь NLP судлаачид олон төрлийн зурагтай хамтын загвартай холбогдох юм. Мөн саяхан ажлын бие дамжуулагдсан бөгөөд шийдвэрлэгдсэн загвар, сургалтын дараа тэмдэглэгчдийн ангилалд байгаа ямар ч тодорхойгүй байдлыг үгүйсгэдэг. Тиймээс, энэ сургалтын хоёр дахь зорилго нь NLP ажилтнуудыг хэрхэн мэдээллээс олон түгшитгэлээр суралцах мэдрэлийн загварыг нэмэгдүүлэх юм.', 'no': 'Følgjande NLP-forskning er basert på høg kvalitetsverkte datasett, som vanlegvis blir henta frå fleire ekspertannotatorar eller folkarbeidsgiver. Standardøvinga for opplæring av maskinelæringsmodeller er å først utføra ulike forskjeller og utføra opplæringa. I denne slutten har det vært mye arbeid på å samla merknader, spesielt for klassifikasjonsprogrammer. Men mange andre oppgåver, særleg i NLP, har unike karakteristikk som ikkje er anslått av standardmodeller for annotasjon, f.eks. merkelavhengighet i sekvensmerkelappar, ukjende merkelappar for anaforiske annotasjonar, eller preferensmerkelappar for rankeringstekstar. I løpet av siste år har forskere opna dette og dekka avstanden. Dette første målet er å kopla til NLP-forskere med tilstand-of-the-art-aggregation-modeller for eit ulike sett av kanalske språk-notasjonsoppgåver. Det finst også ein økende kropp av nyleg arbeid som argumenterer at etter konvensjonen og opplæring med tilgjengelege merkelappar ignorerer noko usikkerhet merkelappara hadde i klassifikasjonane sine, som resulterer i modeller med dårlegare generaliseringsverdiar. Dette er derfor ein andre mål på denne opplæringa å lære NLP-arbeidarar korleis dei kan auka sine (dype) neuralmodeller for å lære frå data med fleire tolkingar.', 'lt': 'The success of NLP research is founded on high-quality annotated datasets, which are usually obtained from multiple expert annotators or crowd workers.  Standartinė praktika mokymui mašinų mokymo modeliuose yra pirmiausia spręsti nesutarimus ir po to atlikti mokymą. Šiuo tikslu atlikta daug pastabų, visų pirma susijusių su klasifikavimo užduotimis, apibendrinimu. However, many other tasks, particularly in NLP, have unique characteristics not considered by standard models of annotation, e.g., label interdependencies in sequence labelling tasks, unrestricted labels for anaphoric annotation, or preference labels for ranking texts.  Pastaraisiais metais mokslininkai tai suprato ir padeda atotrūkį. Pirmasis šio mokymo tikslas – sujungti NLP mokslininkus su naujausiais agregacijos modeliais įvairioms kanoniškos kalbos anotacijos užduotims atlikti. There is also a growing body of recent work arguing that following the convention and training with adjudicated labels ignores any uncertainty the labellers had in their classifications, which results in models with poorer generalisation capabilities.  Todėl antrasis šio mokymo tikslas – išmokyti NLP darbuotojus, kaip jie gali padidinti savo (gilius) nervų modelius, kad jie mokytųsi iš duomenų su daugeliu aiškinimų.', 'pl': 'Sukces badań NLP opiera się na wysokiej jakości adnotacyjnych zbiorach danych, które są zwykle uzyskiwane od wielu ekspertów adnotatorów lub crowdworkerów. Standardową praktyką szkolenia modeli uczenia maszynowego jest najpierw rozstrzyganie sporów, a następnie przeprowadzenie szkolenia. W tym celu poświęcono dużo pracy nad agregacją adnotacji, zwłaszcza w zakresie zadań klasyfikacyjnych. Jednak wiele innych zadań, zwłaszcza w NLP, ma unikalne cechy nieuwzględniane przez standardowe modele adnotacji, np. współzależności etykiet w zadaniach etykietowania sekwencji, nieograniczone etykiety do anaforycznej adnotacji lub etykiety preferencyjne dla tekstów rankingowych. W ostatnich latach naukowcy zrozumieli to i pokrywają lukę. Pierwszym celem tego poradnika jest połączenie naukowców NLP z najnowocześniejszymi modelami agregacji dla zróżnicowanego zestawu kanonicznych zadań adnotacji językowych. Istnieje również coraz większa liczba ostatnich prac twierdzących, że podążanie za konwencją i szkoleniem z uznanymi etykietami ignoruje wszelką niepewność, jaką mieli podmioty etykietujące w swoich klasyfikacjach, co powoduje, że modele o mniejszych możliwościach uogólnienia. Dlatego drugim celem tego poradnika jest nauczenie pracowników NLP, jak mogą rozszerzyć swoje (głębokie) modele neuronowe, aby uczyć się z danych z wieloma interpretacjami.', 'mt': 'Is-suċċess tar-riċerka NLP huwa bbażat fuq settijiet ta’ dejta annotati ta’ kwalità għolja, li normalment jinkisbu minn annotaturi esperti multipli jew ħaddiema tal-massa. Il-prattika standard għat-taħriġ tal-mudelli tat-tagħlim tal-magni hija li l-ewwel jiġu aġġudikati n-nuqqas ta’ qbil u mbagħad jitwettaq it-taħriġ. Għal dan il-għan, kien hemm ħafna xogħol fuq l-aggregazzjoni tal-annotazzjonijiet, b’mod partikolari għall-kompiti ta’ klassifikazzjoni. Madankollu, ħafna kompiti oħra, partikolarment fil-NLP, g ħandhom karatteristiċi uniċi li mhumiex ikkunsidrati minn mudelli standard ta’ annotazzjoni, pereżempju interdipendenzi tat-tikketta f’kompiti ta’ tikkettar tas-sekwenza, tikketti mhux ristretti għall-annotazzjoni anaforika, jew tikketti ta’ preferenza għal testi ta’ klassifikazzjoni. In recent years, researchers have picked up on this and are covering the gap.  L-ewwel għan ta’ dan it-tutorjal huwa li r-riċerkaturi tal-NLP jiġu konnessi ma’ mudelli ta’ aggregazzjoni l-aktar avvanzati għal sett varjat ta’ kompiti ta’ annotazzjoni tal-lingwa kanonika. Hemm ukoll korp dejjem jikber ta’ xogħol riċenti li jargumenta li wara l-konvenzjoni u t-taħriġ b’tikketti a ġġudikati jinjora kwalunkwe in ċertezza li t-tikkettaturi kellhom fil-klassifikazzjonijiet tagħhom, li tirriżulta f’mudelli b’kapaċitajiet ta’ ġeneralizzazzjoni aktar fqira. Therefore, a second objective of this tutorial is to teach NLP workers how they can augment their (deep) neural models to learn from data with multiple interpretations.', 'ro': 'Succesul cercetării PNL se bazează pe seturi de date adnotate de înaltă calitate, care sunt obținute de obicei de la mai mulți adnotatori experți sau angajați în mulțime. Practica standard pentru instruirea modelelor de învățare automată este de a judeca mai întâi dezacordurile și apoi de a efectua instruirea. În acest scop, s-a lucrat foarte mult la agregarea adnotărilor, în special pentru sarcinile de clasificare. Cu toate acestea, multe alte sarcini, în special în PNL, au caracteristici unice care nu sunt luate în considerare de modelele standard de adnotare, de exemplu interdependențele etichetelor în sarcinile de etichetare secvențială, etichetele nelimitate pentru adnotare anaforică sau etichetele preferențiale pentru textele clasificate. În ultimii ani, cercetătorii au recunoscut acest lucru și acoperă decalajul. Un prim obiectiv al acestui tutorial este de a conecta cercetătorii PNL cu modele de agregare de ultimă generație pentru un set divers de sarcini de adnotare a limbajului canonic. Există, de asemenea, un număr tot mai mare de lucrări recente care susțin că urmarea convenției și formarea cu etichete judecate ignoră orice incertitudine pe care etichetatorii o aveau în clasificările lor, ceea ce duce la modele cu capacități mai slabe de generalizare. Prin urmare, un al doilea obiectiv al acestui tutorial este de a învăța lucrătorii PNL cum își pot extinde modelele neuronale (profunde) pentru a învăța din date cu interpretări multiple.', 'sr': 'Uspjeh istraživanja NLP-a osnovan je na višekvalitetnim notiranim podacima, koje obično dobijaju od višestrukih annotatora eksperta ili radnika publike. Standardna praksa za obuku modela učenja mašina je prvo osuđivati neslaganja i onda izvršiti obuku. Za taj cilj, bilo je dosta posla na okupljanju annotacija, posebno za klasifikacijske zadatke. Međutim, mnogi drugi zadatak, posebno u NLP-u, imaju jedinstvene karakteristike koje ne smatraju standardnim modelima annotacije, na primer, međuzavisnosti etikete u zadacima označavanja sekvence, neograničene etikete za anaforske annotacije ili etikete preferencije za redovne tekste. Poslednjih godina, istraživači su pokupili ovo i pokrivali praznine. Prvi cilj ovog nastavnika je povezati istraživače NLP sa modelima agregacije države umjetnosti za različite skupine zadataka za annotaciju kanoničkog jezika. Postoji i odrastajuće tijelo nedavnog rada koji tvrdi da nakon konvencije i obuke sa osuđenim etiketama ignoriše svaku nesigurnost koju su etiketeri imali u svojim klasifikacijama, što rezultira u modelima sa siromašnijim sposobnostima generalizacije. Stoga, drugi cilj ove nastavnice je naučiti radnike NLP kako mogu povećati svoje (duboke) neuralne modele da nauče iz podataka sa višestrukim interpretacijama.', 'sv': 'Framgången med NLP-forskningen bygger på högkvalitativa kommenterade datauppsättningar, som vanligtvis erhålls från flera expertkommentatorer eller crowdworker. Standardpraxis för att träna maskininlärningsmodeller är att först avgöra meningsskiljaktigheterna och sedan utföra utbildningen. Därför har det gjorts mycket arbete med att aggregera anteckningar, särskilt för klassificeringsuppgifter. Många andra uppgifter, särskilt inom den nationella planeringsplanen, har dock unika egenskaper som inte beaktas i standardmodeller för anteckningar, t.ex. ömsesidigt beroende av etiketter i sekvensmärkningsuppgifter, obegränsade etiketter för anaforiska anteckningar eller preferensetiketter för rangordningstexter. De senaste åren har forskarna insett detta och täcker luckan. Ett första mål med denna handledning är att koppla NLP forskare med state-of-the-art aggregeringsmodeller för en mängd olika kanoniska språkanteckningar uppgifter. Det finns också ett växande antal senaste arbeten som hävdar att man efter konventionen och utbildning med dömda etiketter ignorerar all osäkerhet märkningsföretagen hade i sina klassificeringar, vilket resulterar i modeller med sämre generaliseringsförmåga. Därför är ett andra mål med denna handledning att lära NLP-arbetare hur de kan utöka sina (djupa) neurala modeller för att lära av data med flera tolkningar.', 'so': 'Liibaanta baaritaanka NLP waxaa lagu aasaasay sawirada macluumaadka aad u baahan tahay, kuwaas oo inta badan laga helaa shaqo-bixiyeyaasha kharashka ah ama shaqaalaha tirada badan. The standard practice to training machine learning models is to first adjudicate the disagreements and then perform the training.  Taas darteed waxaa dhacday shaqo badan oo ku saabsan sharaf kala gedisan, khusuusan hawlaha fasaxa. Si kastaba ha ahaatee shuqullo badan oo kale, gaar ahaan NLP, waxay leeyihiin takhasusyo gaar ah oo aan laga fiirsanayn tusaale ahaan noocyada caalamiga ah e e calaamadaha ku saabsan shaqooyinka labeecada, calaamada aan la isticmaali karin ama alaabta hore ee qoraalka kala duwan. Sannadihii ugu danbeeyey, wax baaritaanta ayaa waxan soo qaaday oo waxay daboolayaan burburkii. Midowga ugu horeysa ee waxbarashadan waa in lagu xiriiro baaritaanka NLP-da oo ay ku xidhiidhaan tusaalooyin dowlad-ka-farshaxan-ka-farshaxan, si loo sameeyo shaqooyin kala duduwan oo luqada ka mid ah. Waxaa sidoo kale jira jidh shaqo la kordhiyey oo ka doodaya in marka lagu soo qoray heshiiska iyo barashada labada la soo wareejiyo uu ka jeedo wax aan la garanayn in calaamadda laga qoray ay ay ku jirto fasalka, taas oo sababto samooyin ay ku leeyihiin awoodo u baahan dhalashada. Sababtaas darteed goal labaad ee waxbarashadan waa in la baro shaqaalaha NLP sida ay u kordhin karaan qaababka naadiga ah (mool-dheer) si ay uga baraan macluumaad turjubaan kala duduwan.', 'si': 'NLP පරීක්ෂණයේ සාර්ථක විශ්වාස විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ උත්සත් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක දත්ත සේට් වලින් ස්ථාපනය කරලා තිය පළමුවෙනි අවිශ්වාස කරනවා පළමුවෙනි අවිශ්වාස කරනවා ඊට පස්සේ ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න. මේ අවසානයෙන්, ගොඩක් වැඩක් තියෙනවා, විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂ විශේෂ වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන්. නමුත්, විශේෂයෙන්ම, NLP වලින් විශේෂයෙන්, ප්\u200dරමාණික විශේෂතාවක් තියෙන්නේ නැහැ, උදාහරණයෙන්, ලේබල් ප්\u200dරමාණික විශේෂතාවක් වලින් ලේබල් ප්\u200dරම අන්තිම අවුරුදු වලින්, පරීක්ෂකයෝ මේක අල්ලගත්තා, ඒ වගේම අවස්ථාවක් ආවරණය කරනවා. මේ ප්\u200dරධානයේ පළමු අරමුණක් තමයි NLP පරීක්ෂකයන්ට ස්ථානය-of-the-art aggression මොඩේල්ස් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ කරන්න. තවත් අලුත් වැඩේ වැඩේ විශාලනයක් තියෙනවා කියලා කියලා අනිවාර්යාත්මක ලේබල් එක්ක සම්පූර්ණය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පස්සේ, ලේබල්ලර්ස් එක්ක ඔව ඉතින්, මේ ප්\u200dරධානයේ දෙවෙනි අක්ෂේපයක් තමයි NLP වැඩකරුවන්ට කොහොමද ඔවුන්ට ඔවුන්ගේ ගොඩක් (ගොඩක්) න්\u200dයුරල් මොඩේල', 'ta': 'NLP ஆராய்ச்சியின் வெற்றியாக உயர்தரவு அறிவிக்கப்பட்ட தரவுத்தளங்களின் மேல் அடிப்படையிடப்பட்டது, அது வழக்கமாக பல சிறப்பான வ இயந்திரம் கற்றல் மாதிரிகளை பயிற்சி செய்ய இயல்பான பயிற்சி முதலில் வித்தியாசத்தை மாற்றி பின்னர் பயிற்சி ச இந்த முடிவிற்கு, குறிப்பாக வகுப்பு வேலைகளுக்கு நிறைய வேலை ஏற்பட்டுள்ளது. ஆயினும், பல வேறு செயல்கள், குறிப்பாக NLP-ல், தனிப்பட்ட தனிப்பட்ட பணிகள் அறிவிப்பு மாதிரிகளால் பார்க்கப்படவில்லை, உ. ம். விளக்கச்சீட்டு செயல்களின் சார்பு சார்பு செயல்கள், anaphoric சமீபத்திய ஆண்டுகளில், ஆராய்ச்சியாளர்கள் இதை எடுத்து இடைவெளியை மூடிக் கொண்டிருக்கிறார்கள். இந்த பொருளின் முதல் பொருள் என்எல்பி ஆராய்ச்சியாளர்களை மாதிரி கலை குறிப்பு மாதிரிகளுடன் இணைக்க வேண்டும். சமீபத்தில் ஒரு வேலையின் வளர்ச்சிய உடல் இருக்கிறது என்று விவாதம் செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது சிட்டைகளுடன் சுருக்கப்பட்ட சிட்டைகளுடன் பயிற்சியின் பின்னர் அட்டவணைகள் வக எனவே, இந்த பொருளின் இரண்டாவது தலைப்பு என்னவென்றால் NLP பணியாளர்கள் எவ்வாறு அவர்கள் தகவலிலிருந்து பல விளக்கங்களை கற்றுக் கொள்ள முடியும் (', 'ur': 'NLP تحقیقات کا موفقیت اچھی کیفیت کے ذریعہ سے نوٹی ڈاٹ سٹ پر بنیاد ہے، جو اکثر اکثر متخصص انٹاکٹر یا جماعت کارکنوں سے ملے جاتے ہیں. ماشین کی تعلیم مدل کی استاندارڈ کی تعلیم پہلے اختلاف کا فیصلہ کرنا ہے اور پھر تعلیم کرنا ہے اس کے لئے بہت سی کام ہوئی ہیں جو اظہارات جمع کریں، مخصوصاً کلاسیفوں کے کاموں کے لئے۔ However, many other tasks, particularly in NLP, have unique characteristics not considered by standard models of annotation, e.g. label interdependencies in sequence labelling tasks, unrestricted labels for anaphoric annotation, or preference labels for ranking texts. اگلے سالوں میں، تحقیقات کرنے والوں نے اس پر اٹھا لیا ہے اور فضا کو چھپا رہے ہیں۔ اس تعلیم کی پہلی موضوع یہ ہے کہ NLP تحقیقات کرنے والوں کو ایست-of-the-art aggregation مدل کے ساتھ مختلف مختلف مجموعے کے لئے کانونیک زبان اظہار کے کاموں کے ساتھ اتصال کرنا ہے. اور اگلے کاموں کی ایک بڑی جسم بھی ہے جو جھگڑتے ہیں کہ کانٹینس اور ترکینس کے پیچھے فیصلہ کی لابلوں کے ذریعہ لکھی ہوئی مضبوطی کے مطابق لیبلر کو ان کے کلاسیفوں میں لکھا ہوا تھا، اور یہ مدل کے نتیجہ میں کمزور عمومی قابلیت کے ساتھ ہے. لہٰذا، اس تعلیم کی دوسری موضوع یہ ہے کہ NLP کارکنوں کو کس طرح ان کے (عمیق) نیورال موڈل کو زیادہ سکھائیں گے کہ ان کو بہت سی تعلیم کے ساتھ دکھائیں۔', 'vi': 'Thành công của nghiên cứu Njala được dựa trên những bộ dữ liệu được ghi chú cao chất lượng, thường được lấy từ nhiều nhà biên niên chuyên hay đám đông. Quy tắc tiêu chuẩn để huấn luyện các mô hình cổ máy là phán xét trước tiên các bất đồng và sau đó thực hiện huấn luyện. Vì vậy, đã có rất nhiều công việc tổng hợp các chú thích, đặc biệt cho các nhiệm vụ phân loại. Tuy nhiên, nhiều nhiệm vụ khác, đặc biệt ở Njala, có những đặc điểm độc đáo không được xem xét bởi các mô hình chuẩn ghi chú, ví dụ như sự liên quan đến nhau trong các nhiệm vụ nhãn lập trình, nhãn chưa giới hạn cho ghi chú, hay nhãn ưu tiên cho các văn bản xếp hạng. Những năm gần đây, các nhà nghiên cứu đã thu thập và thu thập khoảng cách. Mục tiêu đầu tiên của bài tập huấn này là kết nối các nhà nghiên cứu Chọc/N với các mô hình tổng hợp nghệ thuật hiện đại cho một loạt các công việc ghi chú ngôn ngữ giáo khác nhau. Có một loạt các tác phẩm gần đây đang ngày càng phát triển. Theo như hội nghị và giáo dục với các nhãn được phê chuẩn, bỏ qua bất kỳ sự mơ hồ nào của người môi giới có trong các phân loại, dẫn đến các mô hình có khả năng phổ biến kém hơn. Do đó, mục tiêu thứ hai của bài tập này là dạy cho công nhân NLP cách họ có thể tăng cường mô hình thần kinh của họ để học từ dữ liệu và theo cách khác nhau.', 'uz': "The success of NLP research is founded on high-quality annotated datasets, which are usually obtained from multiple expert annotators or crowd workers.  Masofadagi o'rganish modellarini o'rganish uchun andoza praksiyat birinchi murakkablarni birinchi o'zgartirish va keyin ta'limni bajarish. Va shunday qilib, taqdimotlarni kattalashtirish uchun ko'p ishlar bor. Lekin, boshqa vazifalar NLP bilan boshqa vazifalarning uning xususiyatlari mavjud. Masalan, taʼminlovchi modellarning andoza modellari tomonidan aniqlanmagan, anaforik taʼminlovchi, yoki chegara matnlar uchun tugmalar yordamida qoʻllanilmaydi. Yaqinda yillarda o'qituvchilar bu narsani o'rganishni o'rganishdi va gap qaraydi. Ushbu o'quvchi birinchi obʼekt - NLP ta'qituvchilarini boshqa turli kanonik tillar taʼminlovchi vazifalar uchun holatning holati holatida ulanish mumkin. Yaqinda ishni yaxshi ko'rib chiqindilar quyidagi narsalar mavjud. Ko'rib chiqish tugmalar bilan qo'llangan tugmalar tarkibida hech qanday haqiqat yo'qotmaydi. Bu modellar juda ko'proq generaliz imkoniyatini yaratadi. Bu ta'limning ikkinchi maqsadi, NLP ishlatuvchilarini qanday bir nechta tarjimalar bilan o'rganish uchun neyrol modellarini o'rganish mumkin.", 'nl': 'Het succes van NLP onderzoek is gebaseerd op geannoteerde datasets van hoge kwaliteit, die meestal worden verkregen van meerdere deskundige annotators of crowdworkers. De standaard praktijk om machine learning modellen te trainen is om eerst de meningsverschillen te beslechten en vervolgens de training uit te voeren. Daartoe is er veel werk gedaan aan het aggregeren van annotaties, met name voor classificatietaken. Veel andere taken, met name in NLP, hebben echter unieke kenmerken die niet worden meegenomen door standaardmodellen voor annotatie, zoals onderlinge afhankelijkheid van etiketten bij sequentie-etiketteringstaken, onbeperkte etiketten voor anaforische annotatie of voorkeurslabels voor rankingsteksten. De afgelopen jaren hebben onderzoekers dit opgepikt en dichten deze kloof. Een eerste doelstelling van deze tutorial is om NLP-onderzoekers te verbinden met state-of-the-art aggregatiemodellen voor een diverse reeks canonieke taalannotatietaken. Er is ook een groeiend aantal recente werken waarin wordt beweerd dat het volgen van de conventie en training met erkende labels elke onzekerheid negeert die de labellers hadden in hun classificaties, wat resulteert in modellen met slechtere generaliseringscapaciteiten. Daarom is een tweede doelstelling van deze tutorial om NLP-medewerkers te leren hoe ze hun (diepe) neurale modellen kunnen uitbreiden om te leren van data met meerdere interpretaties.', 'bg': 'Успехът на изследванията на НЛП се основава на висококачествени анотирани набори от данни, които обикновено се получават от множество експертни анотатори или работници в тълпа. Стандартната практика при обучението на модели за машинно обучение е първо да се преценят разногласията и след това да се извърши обучението. За тази цел беше извършена много работа по агрегирането на анотации, особено по отношение на задачите за класификация. Въпреки това, много други задачи, особено в НЛП, имат уникални характеристики, които не се разглеждат от стандартните модели на анотация, например взаимозависимости на етикетите в задачите за последователно етикетиране, неограничени етикети за анафорично анотация или етикети с предпочитания за класиране на текстове. През последните години изследователите са се заели с това и покриват празнината. Първа цел на този урок е да се свърже изследователите на НЛП със съвременни модели на агрегиране за разнообразен набор от задачи за каноничен език анотация. Съществува и все по-голям брой скорошни работи, които твърдят, че следването на конвенцията и обучението с присъдени етикети игнорира всяка несигурност, която етикетиращите имат в своите класификации, което води до модели с по-слаби възможности за обобщаване. Ето защо, втора цел на този урок е да научи работниците на НЛП как те могат да разширят своите (дълбоки) невронни модели, за да се учат от данни с множество интерпретации.', 'da': 'Succesen med NLP-forskning er baseret på højkvalitets annoterede datasæt, som normalt opnås fra flere ekspert annotatorer eller crowd workers. Standardpraksis for at træne maskinlæringsmodeller er først at afgøre uenighederne og derefter udføre træningen. Med henblik herpå har der været meget arbejde med at samle noter, især for klassificeringsopgaver. Mange andre opgaver, især inden for NLP, har dog unikke karakteristika, der ikke tages i betragtning i standardmodeller for notering, f.eks. indbyrdes afhængighed af etiketter i sekvensmærkningsopgaver, ubegrænsede etiketter til anaforiske noteringer eller præferenceetiketter til klassificering af tekster. I de seneste år har forskerne forstået dette og dækker hullet. Et første mål med denne vejledning er at forbinde NLP-forskere med state-of-the-art aggregeringsmodeller til et forskelligartet sæt kanoniske sprogannoteringsopgaver. Der er også et voksende antal nylige arbejder, der argumenterer for, at man efter konventionen og uddannelse med bedømte etiketter ignorerer enhver usikkerhed, som mærkningsvirksomhederne havde i deres klassifikationer, hvilket resulterer i modeller med dårligere generaliseringsevner. Derfor er et andet formål med denne tutorial at lære NLP-arbejdere, hvordan de kan forbedre deres (dybe) neurale modeller til at lære af data med flere fortolkninger.', 'hr': 'Uspjeh istraživanja NLP-a osnovan je na višekvalitetnim notiranim podacima, koje obično dobijaju od višestrukih annotatora stručnjaka ili radnika publike. Standardna vježba za modele učenja strojeva je prvo osuđivati neslaganja i onda izvršiti obuku. Za taj cilj, bilo je mnogo posla na skupljanju annotacija, posebno za tajne zadatke. Međutim, mnogi drugi zadatak, posebno u NLP-u, imaju jedinstvene karakteristike koje ne smatraju standardnim modelima annotacije, npr. međuzavisnosti etikete u zadataka označavanja sekvence, neograničene etikete za anaforske annotacije ili etikete preferencije za redovne tekste. Posljednjih godina, istraživači su se javili na to i pokrivaju praznine. Prvi cilj ovog nastavnika je povezati istraživače NLP-a s modelima aggregacije države umjetnosti za različite skupine zadataka za annotaciju kanoničkog jezika. Postoji i rastuće tijelo nedavnog rada koji tvrdi da nakon konvencije i obuke s odlučenim etiketama ignorira svaku nesigurnost koju su etiketeri imali u svojim klasifikacijama, što rezultira u modelima s siromašnijim sposobnostima generalizacije. Stoga, drugi cilj ove nastavnice je naučiti radnike NLP kako mogu povećati svoj (duboki) neuronski modeli da nauče iz podataka sa višestrukim interpretacijama.', 'de': 'Der Erfolg der NLP-Forschung basiert auf qualitativ hochwertigen annotierten Datensätzen, die in der Regel von mehreren Experten oder Crowdworkern bezogen werden. Die übliche Praxis, Machine Learning Modelle zu trainieren, besteht darin, zuerst die Unstimmigkeiten zu klären und dann das Training durchzuführen. Zu diesem Zweck wurde viel an der Aggregation von Annotationen gearbeitet, insbesondere bei Klassifizierungsaufgaben. Viele andere Aufgaben, insbesondere in NLP, weisen jedoch einzigartige Eigenschaften auf, die von Standardmodellen der Annotation nicht berücksichtigt werden, z.B. Label-Interdependenzen bei Sequenz-Beschriftungsaufgaben, uneingeschränkte Beschriftungen für anaphorische Annotation oder Präferenzbeschriftungen für Ranking-Texte. In den letzten Jahren haben Forscher das aufgegriffen und schließen die Lücke. Ein erstes Ziel dieses Tutorials ist es, NLP-Forscher mit modernsten Aggregationsmodellen für eine Vielzahl kanonischer Sprachannotationsaufgaben zu verbinden. Es gibt auch eine wachsende Anzahl neuerer Arbeiten, die argumentieren, dass die Befolgung der Konvention und das Training mit anerkannten Etiketten jegliche Unsicherheit ignoriert, die die Etikettierer in ihren Klassifizierungen hatten, was zu Modellen mit schlechteren Verallgemeinerungsfähigkeiten führt. Daher ist ein zweites Ziel dieses Tutorials, NLP-Arbeitern beizubringen, wie sie ihre (tiefen) neuronalen Modelle erweitern können, um aus Daten mit mehreren Interpretationen zu lernen.', 'id': 'The success of NLP research is founded on high-quality annotated datasets, which are usually obtained from multiple expert annotators or crowd workers.  Praktika standar untuk melatih model belajar mesin adalah untuk pertama menilai ketidaksetujuan dan kemudian melakukan pelatihan. Untuk tujuan ini, ada banyak pekerjaan untuk agregasi anotasi, terutama untuk tugas klasifikasi. Namun, banyak tugas lainnya, terutama di NLP, memiliki karakteristik unik yang tidak dianggap oleh model standar anotasi, misalnya, interdependensi label dalam tugas pengetiketan urutan, label tidak terbatas untuk anotasi anafora, atau label keutamaan untuk ranging teks. Selama bertahun-tahun terakhir, peneliti telah menerima hal ini dan menutupi ruang tersebut. A first objective of this tutorial is to connect NLP researchers with state-of-the-art aggregation models for a diverse set of canonical language annotation tasks.  Ada juga tumbuh tubuh pekerjaan baru-baru ini berdebat bahwa mengikuti konvensi dan pelatihan dengan label yang diadili mengabaikan ketidakpastian apapun yang diberikan label dalam klasifikasi mereka, yang menghasilkan model dengan kemampuan generalisasi yang lebih buruk. Oleh karena itu, tujuan kedua dari tutorial ini adalah mengajarkan pekerja NLP bagaimana mereka dapat meningkatkan model saraf (dalam) mereka untuk belajar dari data dengan banyak interpretasi.', 'ko': 'NLP 연구의 성공은 보통 여러 전문가의 주석자나 단체 종사자로부터 나온 고품질의 주석 데이터 세트에 세워졌다.기계 학습 모형을 훈련하는 표준적인 방법은 먼저 의견 차이를 판단한 다음에 훈련을 하는 것이다.이를 위해 주석을 모으는 데 많은 노력을 기울였는데, 특히 분류 임무에 있어서는 그렇다.그러나 많은 다른 작업, 특히 NLP의 작업은 표준 주석 모델에서 고려하지 않은 독특한 특징을 가지고 있다. 예를 들어 시퀀스 표기 작업의 라벨 상호 의존성, 주석을 가리키는 무제한 라벨, 랭킹 텍스트의 선호 라벨 등이다.최근 몇 년 동안 연구원들은 이미 이 점을 의식하고 이 격차를 보완하고 있다.이 강좌의 첫 번째 목표는 NLP 연구원을 각종 규범화된 언어 주석 임무의 최신 집합 모델과 연결시키는 것이다.최근에도 공약과 판결 라벨을 이용한 교육이 라벨 업체의 분류 불확실성을 무시하고 모델의 범위화 능력이 떨어진다는 연구가 늘고 있다.따라서 이 강좌의 두 번째 목표는 NLP 종사자에게 다양한 해석이 있는 데이터에서 배울 수 있도록 자기(심층) 신경모델을 강화하는 방법을 가르치는 것이다.', 'fa': 'موفقیت تحقیقات NLP بر روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای بلند کیفیت یادآوری ساخته شده است که معمولاً از نویسندگان چند متخصص یا کارگران جمعیت دریافت می\u200cشود. تمرین استاندارد برای مدل یادگیری ماشین آموزش این است که اولین بار اختلافات را قضاوت کند و بعد آموزش را انجام دهد. برای این قسمت، کار زیادی در مورد جمع کردن اخطار، مخصوصا برای کار های مختلف وجود داشته است. ولی بسیاری از کارهای دیگر، مخصوصا در NLP، ویژگی\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای دارند که توسط مدل\u200cهای استاندارد آشنایی، مثال، وابستگی\u200cهای بین\u200cبستگی برچسب\u200cها در کارهای برچسب\u200cبندی\u200cکننده\u200cهای برچسب\u200cبندی، برچسب\u200cهای بی\u200cمحدود برای آشنایی\u200cکننده\u200cهای آنفوریک، یا برچ در سالهای اخیر، تحقیقات کننده\u200cها روی این موضوع برگرفته\u200cاند و دارند فضا را پوشش می\u200cدهند. اولین هدف این آموزش این است که محققان NLP را با مدل جمع\u200cآوری ایالت هنر برای مجموعه\u200cهای مشخص\u200cدهنده\u200cهای زبان کانونیک ارتباط کند. همچنین یک بدن بزرگ از کارهای اخیر وجود دارد که در دنبال کنفرانس و تمرین با برچسب\u200cهای تصمیم گرفته، هر مطمئنی که برچسب\u200cها در برچسب\u200cهای خود داشتند را نادیده می\u200cگیرد، که نتیجه\u200cی مدل\u200cها با توانایی\u200cهای ضعیف\u200cترین ژنرالیزی است. بنابراین، هدف دوم این آموزش این است که کارگران NLP را آموزش دهند که چگونه می توانند مدلهای عصبی خود را افزایش دهند تا از داده ها با تعبیر چندتا یاد بگیرند.', 'sw': 'Mafanikio ya utafiti wa NLP yameanzishwa kwenye seti za taarifa zilizotajwa kwa kiwango kikubwa, ambazo mara nyingi hupata kutoka kwa wataalamu kadhaa au wafanyakazi wa umma. Utafiti wa kawaida wa kufundisha mifano ya kujifunza mashine ni kuhalalisha tofauti na kisha kutekeleza mafunzo. Kwa mwisho huu, kumekuwa na kazi nyingi kuhusiana na matatizo, has a kwa kazi za usambazaji. Hata hivyo, shughuli nyingine nyingine, hususani NLP, wana tabia za kipekee ambazo hazitangaliwa na mifano ya msingi wa matangazo, kwa mfano, alama inayotegemea katika kazi za kutangaza, mabango yasiyo na maandishi ya kutangaza, au alama za upendeleo kwa maandishi ya rangi. Katika miaka ya hivi karibuni, watafiti wamechukua suala hili na wanazungumzia mpango huo. Lengo la kwanza la somo hili ni kuwaunganisha watafiti wa NLP kwa mitindo ya hali ya sanaa ya kuchaguliwa kwa kazi mbalimbali za lugha za Kikaoni. There is also a growing body of recent work arguing that following the convention and training with adjudicated labels ignores any uncertainty the labellers had in their classifications, which results in models with poorer generalisation capabilities.  Kwa hiyo, lengo la pili la somo hili ni kuwafundisha wafanyakazi wa NLP jinsi wanavyoweza kuongeza mifano ya neura zao ili kujifunza kutoka data kwa tafsiri nyingi.', 'tr': "NLP araştyrmalaryň üstünliki ýokary kwalitet ýazylan veri setirlerinde guruldy. Olar adatça bir näçe uzmanly ýazgytçylar ýa köp işgärlerden berilýär. Maşyny öwrenmek nusgalaryny öwrenmek üçin standart praktika ilkinji gezek närazlyklary çykarmak we soňra öwrenmek üçin. Bu sonuçta, sözleri toplamak üzere birçok çalışma vardı.Özellikle de klasifikasyon görevleri için. Ýöne, iň özellikle NLP'de birnäçe iş g örkezilýän işleriň has beýleki karakterleriň, meselm. etiket baglanyşlary sırala etiketlerde, anaforik täblikler üçin diňe etiketlerde ahmal etiketlerde, ýöne sırala metinler üçin tercihleri görkezilýän etiketlerde. Soňky ýyllar bäri gözlenýänler muny aldylar we gapyny örenýärler. Bu tutuşmanyň ilkinji maksady NLP araştyrçylaryny kanonik dilinde näçe görkezilýän zadlary bilen baglaşdyrmak. Ýakynda ýokary bir işiň bedeni bar, takykly etiketlerle birlikde düzgün etiketleriň klasifikasynda nähili kesinlikleri ýok etýändigini a ýdyşýar. Bu nusgalaryň düýpçilikli döredijilik ukyplaryna netijesi ýok. Şol sebäpli, bu tutuşmanyň ikinji maksady NLP işgärleriniň (derin) neural modellerini birnäçe terjimeler bilen biljek şeklinde üýtgetmegi.", 'af': "Die sukses van NLP-ondersoek is gefundeerd op hoë-kwaliteit-annotateerde datastelle, wat gewoonlik van veelvuldige ekspertiese annotators of skakelwerkers ontvang word. Die standaard praksie om masjien leer modele te onderwerp is om eerste te oordeel die ongeregtighede en dan die onderwerp te doen. Op hierdie einde het daar baie werk gewees op die samekoms van notasies, veral vir klassifikasie taak. Maar baie ander opdragte, veral in NLP, het unieke karakteristieke nie aangeneem deur standaard modele van annotasie, bv. etiket interafhanklikhede in volgorde etiket opdragte, ongestrekke etikette vir anaforiese annotasie, of voorkeure etikette vir ranking teks. In onlangse jaar het ondersoekers op dit opgeneem en die gap oordek. 'n Eerste doel van hierdie onderwyseling is om NLP onderwysers te verbind met state-of-the-art aggregation models vir 'n verskillende stel kanoniese taal annotasie taak te verbind. Daar is ook 'n groei liggaam van onlangse werk wat argumenteer dat volgens die konvensie en onderwerp met afgelê etikette ignoreer enige onbevestigheid wat die etiketlers in hul klasifikasie gehad het, wat resultaat in modele met armer generalisering kapasiteite. Daarom is 'n tweede doel van hierdie onderwyseling om NLP-werkers te leer hoe hulle hul (diep) neurale modele kan vergroot om van data te leer met veelvuldige uitleggings.", 'sq': 'Suksesi i kërkimit të NLP është themeluar në grupe të dhënash të cilësisë së lartë të anotuara, të cilat zakonisht arrihen nga anotatorët e shumëfishtë ekspertë apo punonjësit e turmës. Praktika standarte për trajnimin e modeleve të mësimit të makinave është të gjykojmë së pari mosmarrëveshjet dhe pastaj të kryejmë trajnimin. Për këtë qëllim, ka patur shumë punë në bashkimin e anotacioneve, veçanërisht për detyrat klasifikuese. Megjithatë, shumë detyra të tjera, veçanërisht në NLP, kanë karakteristika unike që nuk konsiderohen nga modelet standard e të anotacionit, për shembull, ndërvarësitë e etiketave në detyrat e etiketave të sekuencës, etiketat pa kufizime për anotacionin anaforik apo etiketat preferenciale për renditjen e teksteve. Në vitet e fundit, kërkuesit e kanë kuptuar këtë dhe po e mbulojnë hapësirën. Një objektiv i parë i këtij mësimi është të lidhë kërkuesit e NLP me modelet e agregacionit më të lartë për një sërë të ndryshme detyrash të anotacionit të gjuhës kanonike. Ka gjithashtu një trup në rritje të punës së fundit duke argumentuar se pas konventës dhe trajnimit me etiketa të gjykuara injoron çdo pasiguri që etiketarët kishin në klasifikimet e tyre, që rezulton në modele me aftësi më të dobëta gjeneralizimi. Prandaj, një objektiv i dytë i këtij mësimi është të mësojë punëtorët e NLP se si mund të rritin modelet e tyre (të thella) nervore për të mësuar nga të dhënat me interpretime të shumta.', 'am': 'የNLP ትምህርት ግንኙነት ከፍ-quality ዳታዎችን በመሠረት ላይ የተመሠረተ ነው፡፡ የሜክስኖችን ማስተማር ሞዴላዎችን ለመማር የመደበኛ ሁኔታ ማስተካከል ነው፡፡ ከዚያም በኋላ ትምህርት ማድረግ ነው፡፡ ለዚህ ምክንያት በተለያዩ ስራዎችን ለማሳደግ ብዙ ስራ ተደረገ፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ ብዙ ሌሎች ስራዎች፣ በተለየ NLP፣ የተለየ የፊደል አካባቢ ምሳሌዎች፣ የlabel interdependencies in sequence tasks፣ ለanaphoric ማስታወሻ ወይም ለመሻለል የጽሑፎች ጽሑፎች የሚታሰሩ ምልክቶች አሉ፡፡ ባለፈው ዓመታት፣ ተመሪዎቹ በዚህ ላይ አነሱት እየተከፈቱትም፡፡ የዚህ ትምህርት መጀመሪያ ጉዳይ የNLP አስተማሪዎችን በሀገር-የ-art ግንኙነት ሞዴላዎችን ለማግኘት ነው፡፡ There is also a growing body of recent work arguing that following the convention and training with adjudicated labels ignores any uncertainty the labellers had in their classifications, which results in models with poorer generalisation capabilities.  ስለዚህም የዚህ ትምህርት ሁለተኛ ጉዳይ የNLP ሠራተኞችን እንዴት እንደሚጨምሩ (ጥልቅ) የኔትራዊ ዓይነታቸውን በብዙ ትርጓሜዎች መማር እንዲችሉ ያስተምራል፡፡', 'hy': 'ՆԼՊ ուսումնասիրության հաջողությունը հիմնված է բարձր որակի annoտացված տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, որոնք սովորաբար ստացվում են բազմաթիվ մասնագետներից կամ ժողովրդի աշխատողներից: Մեքենային ուսումնասիրության մոդելների սովորեցնելու ստանդարտ գործընթացն առաջին անհամաձայնությունները դատելն է և հետո կատարել ուսումնասիրությունը: Այսպիսով, շատ աշխատանք է կատարվել գրառումների համախմբման վրա, հատկապես դասակարգման խնդիրների համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, շատ այլ խնդիրներ, հատկապես ՆԼՊ-ում, ունեն յուրահատուկ հատկություններ, որոնք չեն հաշվի առնելու ստանդարտ մոդելների վրա, օրինակ, պիտակների միջկակախվածություններ հաջորդականության պիտակների մեջ, անսահմանափակ պիտակներ անաֆորական նոտացիաների համար կամ նա Վերջին տարիների ընթացքում հետազոտողները հասկացել են սա և ծածկում են այդ տարբերությունը: Այս դասարանի առաջին նպատակն է կապել ՆԼՊ-ի հետազոտողներին նորագույն համախմբման մոդելների հետ, որոնք օգտագործում են տարբեր քանոնիկ լեզուների annoտացիոն խնդիրներ: Կա նաև վերջին աշխատանքների աճող մարմին, որն ասում է, որ համոզմունքի և դատաստական պիտակներով ուսումնասիրության հետևելը անտեսում է պիտակների ցանկացած անորոշությունը իրենց դասակարգումներում, ինչը հանգեցնում է մոդելներին, որոնք ավելի վատ ընդհանուր ընդունակություններով են Այսպիսով, այս դասարանի երկրորդ նպատակն է սովորեցնել ՆԼՊ-ի աշխատակիցներին, թե ինչպես են նրանք կարող բարելավել իրենց (խորը) նյարդային մոդելները, որպեսզի սովորեն տվյալներից բազմաթիվ մեկնաբանություններով:', 'bn': 'এনএলপি গবেষণার সফলতা হাই-মানের বিষয়টির উপর প্রতিষ্ঠিত হয়, যা সাধারণত বিশেষ বিশেষজ্ঞ বা জনগণের শ্রমিক থেকে পাওয়া যায়। The standard practice to training machine learning models is to first adjudicate the disagreements and then perform the training.  এই শেষ পর্যন্ত, বিশেষ করে শ্রেণীবিভাগের কাজের জন্য বিশেষ করে বিভিন্ন কাজের জন্য অনেক কাজ রয়েছে। তবে অনেক কাজ, বিশেষ করে এনএলপিতে বিশেষ করে বিভিন্ন বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর মডেল দ্বারা বিবেচনা করা না, যেমন লেবেলেটের কেন্দ্রীয় কাজের মধ্যে নির্ভরশীল, আন্যানোফিক বি সাম্প্রতিক বছরগুলোতে গবেষকেরা এই বিষয়টি নিয়ে এসেছে এবং তারা এই বিভ্রান্ত কাভার করছে। এই শিক্ষার্থীর প্রথম উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে এনএলপি-এর গবেষকদের সাথে সংযোগ করার জন্য বিভিন্ন ধরনের ক্যানোনিক্যাল ভাষা বিভিন্ন ক্যানোন সাম্প্রতিক কাজের একটি শরীর যুক্তি রয়েছে যে কনভেন্ট এবং প্রশিক্ষণ অনুসরণ করা লেবেলের সাথে নিজেদের বিভিন্ন নিশ্চিত কোন নিশ্চিততা উপেক্ষা করে যাচ্ছে, যার ফলে ত Therefore, a second objective of this tutorial is to teach NLP workers how they can augment their (deep) neural models to learn from data with multiple interpretations.', 'az': 'NLP araştırmalarının başarısızlığı yüksək kaliteli bildirilmiş veri setlərində qurulmuşdur. Bunlar genellikle çoxlu ekspertli annotator və qüvvət işçilərindən alınırlar. Makina öyrənmə modellərini təhsil etmək standart praksisi ilk dəfə mübahisə etməkdir və sonra təhsil etməkdir. Bu səbəbdə, məsələn klasifikasiya görevlərin toplaması üçün çox iş var. Lakin, NLP-də özlərinə təkcə başqa bir çox işlər, standart məlumatların modelləri ilə g örünməyən, məsələlər məlumatlarında etiketli bağlılıqları, anaforik məlumatların etiketləri və ya səf məlumatların seçimləri ilə müəyyən edilməz etiketlər vardır. Son illərdə, araştırmacılar bunun üstünü aldılar və boşluğu örtərlər. Bu öyrəndiyin ilk məqsədi, NLP araştırmacılarını müxtəlif canonical dil məlumatlarının məlumatlarına birləşdirməkdir. Həmçin in yeni işin vücudu var ki, konvencija və təhsil etiketlərlə birlikdə müəyyən edilən etiketlərin klasifikasyonunda olan hər bir təhlükəsizlik yoxdur, bu da daha zəif generalizasyon qabiliyyəti ilə modellərə nəticə edir. Buna görə də bu öyrənmənin ikinci məqsədi NLP işçilərini çoxlu təfsirlərlə məlumatlarından öyrənmək üçün növral modellərini necə artıra biləcəklərini öyrətməkdir.', 'cs': 'Úspěch NLP výzkumu je založen na kvalitních anotovaných datových sadách, které jsou obvykle získány od více expertních anotátorů nebo crowdworkerů. Standardní praxí pro trénink modelů strojového učení je nejprve rozhodnout neshody a pak provést školení. Za tímto účelem bylo mnoho práce na agregaci anotací, zejména pro klasifikační úlohy. Nicméně mnoho dalších úkolů, zejména v NLP, má jedinečné vlastnosti, které standardní modely anotace nezohlední, např. vzájemné závislosti etiket v úlohách sekvenčního označování, neomezené štítky pro anaforickou anotaci nebo preferenční štítky pro hodnocení textů. V posledních letech to výzkumníci zachytili a tuto mezeru pokrývají. Prvním cílem tohoto návodu je propojit výzkumníky NLP s nejmodernějšími agregačními modely pro různorodou sadu kanonických jazykových anotací. V současné době se také stále větší množství práce tvrdí, že následování konvence a školení s uznávanými etiketami ignoruje veškerou nejistotu, kterou měli etiketaři ve svých klasifikacích, což vede k modelům s nižšími generalizačními schopnostmi. Proto je druhým cílem tohoto návodu naučit pracovníky NLP, jak mohou rozšířit své (hluboké) neuronové modely, aby se učili z dat s více interpretacemi.', 'et': 'NLP uuringute edukus põhineb kvaliteetsetel annoteeritud andmekogumitel, mis tavaliselt saadakse mitmetelt ekspertidelt annoteerijatelt või rahvatöötajatelt. Masinõppe mudelite koolitamise tavaks on esmalt lahendada lahkarvamused ja seejärel läbi viia koolitus. Selleks on märkuste koondamisel tehtud palju tööd, eriti klassifitseerimisülesannete puhul. Kuid paljudel teistel ülesannetel, eriti uue õppekava puhul, on ainulaadsed omadused, mida standardsete märgistusmudelite puhul ei arvestata, näiteks märgistuste vastastikune sõltuvus järjestuse märgistamise ülesannetes, piiramatud märgistused anafoorsete märgistuste jaoks või eelistuste märgistused tekstide järjestuses. Viimastel aastatel on teadlased sellest aru saanud ja katavad selle lõhe. Selle õpetuse esimene eesmärk on ühendada NLP teadlased kaasaegsete koondamismudelitega erinevate kanooniliste keele annoteerimise ülesannete jaoks. Üha rohkem on ka hiljutisi tööd väidetud, et konventsiooni järgimisel ja väljaõppel tunnustatud märgistustega eiratakse igasugust ebakindlust, mida märgistajad oma klassifikatsioonis olid, mistõttu on mudelid kehvema üldistamisvõimega. Seetõttu on käesoleva õpetuse teine eesmärk õpetada NLP töötajaid, kuidas nad saavad täiendada oma (sügavaid) närvimudeleid, et õppida andmetest mitme tõlgendusega.', 'fi': 'NLP-tutkimuksen menestys perustuu korkealaatuisiin annotoituihin aineistoihin, jotka saadaan yleensä useilta asiantuntijaannotoijilta tai joukkotyöntekijöiltä. Koneoppimismallien kouluttamisen tavanomainen käytäntö on ratkaista erimielisyydet ensin ja suorittaa koulutus. Tätä varten merkintöjen kokoamisessa on tehty paljon työtä erityisesti luokitustehtävissä. Monilla muilla tehtävillä, erityisesti NLP:ssä, on kuitenkin ainutlaatuisia ominaisuuksia, joita ei oteta huomioon vakiomuotoisissa huomautusmalleissa, kuten merkkien keskinäiset riippuvuudet järjestysmerkintätehtävissä, rajoittamattomat merkinnät anaforisia merkintöjä varten tai preferenssimerkinnät tekstien luokittelussa. Viime vuosina tutkijat ovat huomanneet tämän ja peittävät tämän kuilun. Tämän opetusohjelman ensimmäinen tavoite on yhdistää NLP-tutkijat uusimpiin aggregointimalleihin erilaisiin kanonisiin kielen annotointitehtäviin. Viimeaikaista työtä on myös esitetty yhä useammin sen mukaan, että sopimuksen noudattamisessa ja hyväksytyillä etiketeillä annettavassa koulutuksessa jätetään huomiotta kaikki epävarmuudet, joita merkinantajilla oli luokituksissaan, mikä johtaa malleihin, joiden yleistyskyky on heikompi. Tämän opetusohjelman toinen tavoite on opettaa NLP:n työntekijöille, miten he voivat lisätä (syviä) neuromalleja oppimaan datasta moninkertaisilla tulkinnoilla.', 'bs': 'Uspjeh istraživanja NLP-a osnovan je na visokokvalitetnim notiranim podacima, koje obično dobijaju od višestrukih annotatora stručnjaka ili radnika publike. Standardna praksa za obuku modela učenja strojeva je prvo osuđivati neslaganja i onda izvršiti obuku. Za taj cilj, bilo je dosta posla na okupljanju annotacija, posebno za klasifikacijske zadatke. Međutim, mnogi drugi zadatak, posebno u NLP-u, imaju jedinstvene karakteristike koje ne smatraju standardnim modelima annotacije, npr. međuzavisnosti etikete u zadacima označavanja sekvence, neograničene etikete za anaforske annotacije ili etikete preferencije za redovne tekste. Posljednjih godina, istraživači su se javili na ovo i pokrivaju prazninu. Prvi cilj ovog nastavnika je povezati istraživače NLP sa modelima agregacije države umjetnosti za različite skupine zadataka za annotaciju kanoničkog jezika. Postoji i rastuće tijelo nedavnog rada koji tvrdi da nakon konvencije i obuke sa presudiranim etiketama ignorira svaku nesigurnost koju su etiketeri imali u svojim klasifikacijama, što rezultira u modelima sa siromašnijim sposobnostima generalizacije. Stoga, drugi cilj ove nastavnice je naučiti radnike NLP kako mogu povećati svoj (duboki) neuralni modeli da nauče iz podataka sa višestrukim interpretacijama.', 'ca': "The success of NLP research is founded on high-quality annotated datasets, which are usually obtained from multiple expert annotators or crowd workers.  The standard practice to training machine learning models is to first adjudicate the disagreements and then perform the training.  Per això, hi ha hagut molta feina en agregar anotacions, especialment per a tasques de classificació. However, many other tasks, particularly in NLP, have unique characteristics not considered by standard models of annotation, e.g., label interdependencies in sequence labelling tasks, unrestricted labels for anaphoric annotation, or preference labels for ranking texts.  In recent years, researchers have picked up on this and are covering the gap.  A first objective of this tutorial is to connect NLP researchers with state-of-the-art aggregation models for a diverse set of canonical language annotation tasks.  També hi ha un munt creixent de treballs recents que argumenten que segons la convenció i l'entrenament amb etiquetes adjudicades ignora qualsevol incertitud que els etiquetadors tinguin en les seves classificacions, que resulta en models amb capacitats de generalització més pobres. Therefore, a second objective of this tutorial is to teach NLP workers how they can augment their (deep) neural models to learn from data with multiple interpretations.", 'jv': 'Perusahaan resmi NLP bukalir seneng nggawe dataset sing dadi luwih nggawe barang kelas, awak dhéwé butawak dhéwé uga sing entuk sing perusahaan karo atusan akeh sing paling maneh karo hal-peringatan sing paling dhéwé. Awakdhéwé kuwi mesthi, nik kuwi nggawe model sing nyimpen manut kuwi, nik ngupakan langgar kuwi tindakan. Sampeyan iki, akeh akeh operasi mu ngeremukno, ngomong kedhanan kanggo kelas obah politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Dino ngono cah-cah dumadhi, cah-cah sabanjuré awak iki ngono ngono kuwi nggawe barang. goal Genjer Awak dhéwé, aksi wis segondi kanggo tutorial iki dadi kanggo nyelaran NLP manukake piye ngerasar modèl Nyural sing isih perusahaan dhéwé.', 'sk': 'Uspeh raziskav NLP temelji na visokokakovostnih označenih naborih podatkov, ki jih običajno pridobimo od več strokovnih označevalcev ali množičnih delavcev. Standardna praksa za usposabljanje modelov strojnega učenja je, da najprej odločimo o nesoglasjih in nato opravimo usposabljanje. V ta namen je bilo veliko dela pri združevanju opomb, zlasti pri opravilih klasifikacije. Vendar imajo številne druge naloge, zlasti v novem programu, edinstvene značilnosti, ki jih standardni modeli označevanja ne upoštevajo, npr. medsebojne odvisnosti nalog označevanja zaporedja, neomejene nalepke za anaforično označevanje ali prednostne nalepke za razvrščanje besedil. V zadnjih letih so raziskovalci to ugotovili in pokrivali vrzel. Prvi cilj te vadnice je povezati raziskovalce NLP z najsodobnejšimi modeli združevanja za različne naloge kanoničnega jezika označevanja. Prav tako je vse več nedavnih del, ki trdijo, da sledenje konvenciji in usposabljanju z odločenimi oznakami ne upošteva negotovosti, ki so jih imeli označevalci pri svojih klasifikacijah, kar ima za posledico modele s slabšimi sposobnostmi posploševanja. Zato je drugi cilj te vadnice naučiti delavce NLP, kako lahko povečajo svoje (globoke) nevronske modele, da se učijo iz podatkov z več interpretacijami.', 'he': 'הצלחה של מחקר NLP מובססת על קבוצות מידע איכות גבוהה, אשר בדרך כלל נוצרות ממציאות מומחיות רבות או עובדי קהל. האימון הסטנדרטי לאימון מודלים ללמוד מכונות הוא לשפוט קודם את ההסכמות ואז לבצע את האימון. למטרה זו, היו הרבה עבודות על התאספות ציונים, במיוחד עבור משימות מסווג. למרות זאת, למשימות רבות אחרות, במיוחד ב-NLP, יש אופיינים ייחודיים שלא נחשבים על ידי דוגמנים סטנדרטיים של ציונים, למשל התלויות בין תגים במשימות ציונים רצף, תוויות ללא מוגבלות עבור ציונים אנפוריים, או תוויות עדיפות לטקסטים מדרגים. In recent years, researchers have picked up on this and are covering the gap.  מטרה ראשונה של הלימודים האלה היא לחבר את חוקרי NLP עם מודלים אגרגרגציה חדשים למערכת משימות של שיפות קנוניות. There is also a growing body of recent work arguing that following the convention and training with adjudicated labels ignores any uncertainty the labellers had in their classifications, which results in models with poorer generalisation capabilities.  Therefore, a second objective of this tutorial is to teach NLP workers how they can augment their (deep) neural models to learn from data with multiple interpretations.', 'ha': "An samar da fassarar research na NLP an asa a kan tsarin da aka yi taƙaita wa data, wanda ko da yawa aka ci daga masu taƙaitãwa masu yawa ko masu aikin mutane. Tsarin da aka daidaita wa wa'anar da misalin ayuka da aka karanta mashine ya zama kwanza a jurna iskurati da sa'an nan ka cika shirin. Ga wannan, an sami aikin mãsu yawa a kan zartar da su, hususanci ga aikin classified. A lokacin da, wasu aikin dabam masu amfani da, hususan cikin NLP, sun ƙulla wasu masu ƙayyade wanda ba su yi bincike ba da tsarin shiryoyin ayuka na daidaita, misali, masu tsakaita cikin aikin label in masu sequence, kuma da alama ba'a karanta wa alama wa anaforiki, ko kuma alama masu son marubuta wa littãfin da aka rubũta. A cikin yinin da suka sani, watani sun ɗauki wannan kuma suna rufe tsakanin. Bayan abu na farkon wannan tutur yana haɗi watan NLP da shiryoyin-state-of-the-art-motsi wa wasu aikin mai sanarwa na lugha canonical. Ana sami wani jiki mai ƙaranci na aikin a yanzu sunã jãyayya cẽwa, bayan wa wa'adin da wa'anar da aka jurna alama, ba ya ƙyale wani na'anar musamman da suka kasance a cikin siffaffinsu, wannan yana ƙara da misãlai da abincin matalauci mafiya rauni. Ga haka, wani abu na biyu na wannan muhalli yana sanar da aikin NLP yadda za su iya ƙara misãlai na ƙarƙashin neura dõmin su iya karanta daga data da fassarar-fassararsu masu yawa.", 'bo': 'NLP འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་གྲུབ་སྐྱོར་ཡོད་པའི་གནད་དོན་ཡིག་ཆ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གཞི་བཙུགས་ཡོད། རྩོམ་འཁོར་གྱི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་གི་མ་དབྱིབས་གྱི་གྲ་སྒྲིག་ནི་མི་དབང་ཆ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་དགོས། མཇུག་ལ་དེ་ལྟར་བཤད་སྐུལ་ཚོར་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད། However, many other tasks, particularly in NLP, have unique characteristics not considered by standard models of annotation, e.g., label interdependencies in sequence labelling tasks, unrestricted labels for anaphoric annotation, or preference labels for ranking texts. དབུས་གཞུང་གི་ལོ་ངོ་མཇུག་གི་རིང་ལ་་་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་ས་བར་གནས་སྟངས་གཞི་བཀག་ཡོད། སྒྲ་བརྙན་འདིའི་གོ་སྐབས་ཡིག་གི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དང་པོ་སྤྱད་ནས་NLP རྟོགས་མཁན་ཚོས་གནས་ཡུལ་of-the-art aggregation models་དང་ལ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་ཡིན། There is also a growing body of recent work arguing that following the convention and training with adjudicated labels ignores any uncertainty the labellers had in their classifications, which results in models with poorer generalisation capabilities. འོན་ཀྱང་། སྒྲུང་ཕྱོགས་འདིའི་གཉིས་པ་གི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གཉིས་པ་ནི་NLP işçilerin nasıl oluşturabilirlerini... ...རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་neural models་དང་། multiple interpretations སྦྱར་ནས་གནས་ཚུལ་འད'}
{'en': 'Tutorial Proposal : End-to-End Speech Translation', 'fr': 'Proposition de didacticiel\xa0: traduction vocale de bout en bout', 'es': 'Propuesta de tutorial: traducción de voz de principio', 'pt': 'Proposta de tutorial: tradução de fala de ponta a ponta', 'ar': 'اقتراح تعليمي: ترجمة شاملة للكلام', 'zh': '教程提案:端到端语音译', 'ru': 'Учебное предложение: Сквозной перевод речи', 'ja': 'チュートリアルの提案：エンドツーエンドのスピーチ翻訳', 'hi': 'ट्यूटोरियल प्रस्ताव: एंड-टू-एंड स्पीच अनुवाद', 'ga': 'Togra Teagaisc: Aistriúchán Cainte ó cheann ceann', 'ka': 'შესწავლებელი პროფესტი: ბოლოდან ბოლოდან ბოლოდან დასრულებული სიტყვას', 'el': 'Πρόταση εκμάθησης: Ολοκληρωμένη μετάφραση ομιλίας', 'hu': 'Oktatójavaslat: End-to-End beszédfordítás', 'lt': 'Mokymo pasiūlymas: kalbos vertimas nuo pabaigos', 'it': 'Proposta tutorial: Traduzione vocale end-to-end', 'kk': 'Оқыту мәліметі: аяқтау- аяқтау аудармасы', 'mk': 'Предлог за учење: Превед од крај до крај на говор', 'ms': 'Proposal Tutorial: End-to-End Speech Translation', 'ml': 'ഉപദേശിക്കുന്ന പ്രൊഫസല്\u200d: അവസാന- മുതല്\u200d അവസാന സംസാരം പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുക', 'mt': 'Proposta Tutorjali: Traduzzjoni tal-kelma minn tmiem sa tmiem', 'mn': 'Боловсролын зөвлөгөө: Эцэст нь эцэст нь эцэст нь ярианы орчуулалт', 'pl': 'Wniosek samouczkowy: kompleksowe tłumaczenie mowy', 'no': 'Opplæringsforslag: Enda- til- slutt taleomsetjing', 'ro': 'Propunere tutorial: Traducere vocală end-to-end', 'sr': 'Prijedlog za učenje: prevod govora do kraja', 'si': 'ශීෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්: අවසාන වාර්තාවට අවසාන වාර්තාව', 'so': 'Waxbarashada: Turjumista hadalka dhammaadka iyo dhammaadka', 'sv': 'Handledningsförslag: End-to-End Talöversättning', 'ta': 'பயிற்சி குணங்கள்: முடிவு- முடிவு பேச்சு மொழிபெயர்ப்பு', 'ur': 'تعلیم پیشنهاد: End- to- End Speech Translation', 'vi': 'Bài diễn văn tổng hợp', 'uz': 'Tarjima xossalari: End to- End of speech tarjima', 'bg': 'Предложение за обучение: Превод на реч от край до край', 'hr': 'Prijedlog obrazovanja: prevod govora do kraja', 'nl': 'Voorstel voor zelfstudie: End-to-End spraakvertaling', 'de': 'Tutorial Vorschlag: End-to-End Sprachübersetzung', 'ko': '강좌 제안: 끝에서 끝까지 음성 번역', 'id': 'Proposisi Tutorial: Terjemahan Bicara Akhir-Akhir', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Kisomo: Utafiti wa Hotuba ya mwisho-hadi mwisho', 'tr': 'Öwrenme Maglumaty: Ahyrdan soňra söz terjime', 'fa': 'پیشنهاد آموزش: ترجمه سخنرانی پایان تا پایان', 'sq': 'Propozimi mësues: Translacioni i fjalës nga fundi në fund', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'da': 'Vejledningsforslag: End-to-End Tale Oversættelse', 'af': 'Tutoriële Voorwerp: Einde na- einde Spraak Vertaling', 'hy': 'Գործողական առաջարկ. խոսքի վերջ-վերջ թարգմանություն', 'az': '칐yr톛nm톛 T톛rc칲m칲: End-to-End S칬z T톛rc칲m칲', 'bs': 'Prijedlog obrazovanja: prevod govora do kraja', 'bn': 'শিক্ষার্থীর বৈশিষ্ট্য: শেষ- থেকে শেষ বাক্য অনুবাদ', 'cs': 'Návrh návodu: End-to-End překlad řeči', 'et': 'Õppekava ettepanek: kõne lõpuni tõlkimine', 'fi': 'Tutorial Proposal: End-to-End Speech Translation', 'ca': 'Proposta de tutorial: Traducció de la llengua fins al final', 'ha': 'Tutorial Proposal: End-to-End Speech Translation', 'he': 'הצעה לימודית: תורגם על ידי סוף-סוף', 'sk': 'Predlog vadnice: Prevajanje govora od konca do konca', 'bo': 'རྩིས་མྱོང་གི་སྤྲོད་ཆེན། མཇུག་ལ་མཇུག་བསྡུ་ཡི་སྐད་བརྗོད།', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness'}
{'en': 'Speech translation is the translation of speech in one language typically to text in another, traditionally accomplished through a combination of automatic speech recognition and machine translation. Speech translation has attracted interest for many years, but the recent successful applications of deep learning to both individual tasks have enabled new opportunities through joint modeling, in what we today call ‘end-to-end speech translation.’ In this tutorial we will introduce the techniques used in cutting-edge research on speech translation. Starting from the traditional cascaded approach, we will given an overview on data sources and model architectures to achieve state-of-the art performance with end-to-end speech translation for both high- and low-resource languages. In addition, we will discuss methods to evaluate analyze the proposed solutions, as well as the challenges faced when applying speech translation models for real-world applications.', 'ar': 'ترجمة الكلام هي ترجمة الكلام في إحدى اللغات عادةً إلى نص في لغة أخرى ، ويتم تحقيقها تقليديًا من خلال مزيج من التعرف التلقائي على الكلام والترجمة الآلية. لقد اجتذبت ترجمة الكلام الاهتمام لسنوات عديدة ، ولكن التطبيقات الناجحة الحديثة للتعلم العميق لكلتا المهمتين الفرديتين أتاحت فرصًا جديدة من خلال النمذجة المشتركة ، فيما نسميه اليوم "ترجمة الكلام من طرف إلى طرف". في هذا البرنامج التعليمي سوف نقدم التقنيات المستخدمة في أحدث الأبحاث حول ترجمة الكلام. بدءًا من النهج المتتالي التقليدي ، سنقدم نظرة عامة على مصادر البيانات وبنى النماذج لتحقيق أداء متطور مع ترجمة الكلام من طرف إلى طرف لكل من اللغات عالية ومنخفضة الموارد. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، سنناقش طرق تقييم تحليل الحلول المقترحة ، بالإضافة إلى التحديات التي نواجهها عند تطبيق نماذج ترجمة الكلام لتطبيقات العالم الحقيقي.', 'fr': "La traduction vocale est la traduction de la parole dans une langue, généralement en texte dans une autre, réalisée traditionnellement par une combinaison de reconnaissance vocale automatique et de traduction automatique. La traduction vocale suscite de l'intérêt depuis de nombreuses années, mais les récentes applications réussies du deep learning aux deux tâches individuelles ont ouvert de nouvelles opportunités grâce à la modélisation conjointe, dans ce que nous appelons aujourd'hui la «\xa0traduction vocale de bout en bout\xa0». Dans ce tutoriel, nous présenterons les techniques utilisées dans les recherches de pointe sur la traduction vocale. En partant de l'approche en cascade traditionnelle, nous donnerons un aperçu des sources de données et des architectures de modèles permettant d'obtenir des performances de pointe avec une traduction vocale de bout en bout pour les langues à ressources élevées et faibles. En outre, nous discuterons des méthodes d'évaluation et d'analyse des solutions proposées, ainsi que des défis rencontrés lors de l'application de modèles de traduction vocale pour des applications réelles.", 'es': 'La traducción de voz es la traducción del habla en un idioma, normalmente a texto en otro, que tradicionalmente se realiza mediante una combinación de reconocimiento automático de voz y traducción automática. La traducción de voz ha despertado interés durante muchos años, pero las recientes y exitosas aplicaciones del aprendizaje profundo en ambas tareas individuales han permitido nuevas oportunidades a través del modelado conjunto, en lo que hoy llamamos «traducción de voz de extremo a extremo». En este tutorial presentaremos las técnicas utilizadas en la investigación de vanguardia sobre la traducción del habla. Partiendo del enfoque tradicional en cascada, ofreceremos una visión general de las fuentes de datos y las arquitecturas de modelos para lograr un rendimiento de vanguardia con traducción de voz de extremo a extremo para idiomas de recursos altos y bajos. Además, discutiremos los métodos para evaluar y analizar las soluciones propuestas, así como los desafíos que se enfrentan al aplicar modelos de traducción de voz para aplicaciones del mundo real.', 'pt': "A tradução de fala é a tradução de fala em um idioma normalmente para texto em outro, tradicionalmente realizada por meio de uma combinação de reconhecimento automático de fala e tradução automática. A tradução de fala atraiu interesse por muitos anos, mas as recentes aplicações bem-sucedidas de aprendizado profundo para ambas as tarefas individuais permitiram novas oportunidades por meio de modelagem conjunta, no que hoje chamamos de 'tradução de fala de ponta a ponta'. Neste tutorial, apresentaremos as técnicas usadas na pesquisa de ponta sobre tradução de fala. A partir da abordagem em cascata tradicional, forneceremos uma visão geral das fontes de dados e arquiteturas de modelo para obter desempenho de última geração com tradução de fala de ponta a ponta para linguagens de alto e baixo recurso. Além disso, discutiremos métodos para avaliar e analisar as soluções propostas, bem como os desafios enfrentados na aplicação de modelos de tradução de fala para aplicações do mundo real.", 'ja': '音声翻訳は、ある言語の音声を別の言語のテキストに翻訳することであり、伝統的に、自動音声認識と機械翻訳の組み合わせによって達成されます。音声翻訳は長年にわたって関心を集めてきたが、最近のディープラーニングの両方の個々のタスクへの適用が成功したことで、ジョイントモデリングを通じて新しい機会が可能になり、今日では「エンドツーエンド音声翻訳」と呼ばれている。「このチュートリアルでは、音声翻訳に関する最先端の研究で使用されているテクニックを紹介します。従来のカスケード化されたアプローチから始まり、高リソース言語と低リソース言語の両方のエンドツーエンドの音声翻訳で最先端のパフォーマンスを達成するためのデータソースとモデルアーキテクチャの概要を説明します。さらに、提案されたソリューションを評価し、分析する方法と、現実のアプリケーションに音声翻訳モデルを適用する際に直面する課題について説明します。', 'zh': '语音翻译者,以一言之语音翻译,常转为一言之本,古者以别机器翻译成之。 数年以来,语音译者备见关注,然近习两事成功建模(宜合从合,今谓之"端到端语音译")供新会。 本教程之中,将见于语音译者。 自旧级联之法,将概述数据源模架构,以成高资言语、低资源言语之端,语音译者先进。 又将论估解决方案之法,及译形于实际之挑战。', 'ru': 'Перевод речи - это перевод речи на один язык, как правило, на текст на другом языке, традиционно выполняемый посредством комбинации автоматического распознавания речи и машинного перевода. Перевод речи привлекает интерес на протяжении многих лет, но недавние успешные приложения глубокого обучения для обеих отдельных задач дали новые возможности благодаря совместному моделированию, в том, что мы сегодня называем «сквозным переводом речи». «В этом учебнике мы представим методы, используемые в передовых исследованиях по речевому переводу. Начиная с традиционного каскадного подхода, мы дадим обзор источников данных и архитектур моделей для достижения современной производительности со сквозным переводом речи для языков с высоким и низким уровнем ресурсов. Кроме того, мы обсудим методы оценки и анализа предлагаемых решений, а также проблемы, возникающие при применении моделей речевого перевода для реальных приложений.', 'hi': "भाषण अनुवाद एक भाषा में भाषण का अनुवाद है जो आमतौर पर दूसरे में पाठ के लिए होता है, पारंपरिक रूप से स्वचालित भाषण पहचान और मशीन अनुवाद के संयोजन के माध्यम से पूरा किया जाता है। भाषण अनुवाद ने कई वर्षों से रुचि को आकर्षित किया है, लेकिन दोनों व्यक्तिगत कार्यों के लिए गहरी शिक्षा के हाल के सफल अनुप्रयोगों ने संयुक्त मॉडलिंग के माध्यम से नए अवसरों को सक्षम किया है, जिसे हम आज 'एंड-टू-एंड स्पीच ट्रांसलेशन' कहते हैं। इस ट्यूटोरियल में हम भाषण अनुवाद पर अत्याधुनिक अनुसंधान में उपयोग की जाने वाली तकनीकों को पेश करेंगे। पारंपरिक कैस्केड दृष्टिकोण से शुरू करते हुए, हम उच्च और निम्न-संसाधन दोनों भाषाओं के लिए एंड-टू-एंड भाषण अनुवाद के साथ अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करने के लिए डेटा स्रोतों और मॉडल आर्किटेक्चर पर एक सिंहावलोकन देंगे। इसके अलावा, हम प्रस्तावित समाधानों का विश्लेषण करने के तरीकों पर चर्चा करेंगे, साथ ही वास्तविक दुनिया के अनुप्रयोगों के लिए भाषण अनुवाद मॉडल लागू करते समय आने वाली चुनौतियों पर भी चर्चा करेंगे।", 'ga': 'Is éard is aistriúchán cainte ann ná aistriú cainte i dteanga amháin go hiondúil go téacs i dteanga eile, a chuirtear i gcrích go traidisiúnta trí mheascán d’aitheantas uathoibríoch cainte agus aistriúchán meaisín. Tá suim ag baint leis an aistriúchán cainte le blianta fada anuas, ach tá deiseanna nua curtha ar fáil trí chomhshamhaltú mar a dtugaimid inniu ‘aistriúchán cainte ó cheann go ceann’ mar gheall ar chur i bhfeidhm rathúil na foghlama domhain ar an dá thasc aonair le déanaí. Sa rang teagaisc seo tabharfaimid isteach na teicníochtaí a úsáidtear i dtaighde ceannródaíoch ar aistriúchán cainte. Ag tosú leis an gcur chuige traidisiúnta cascáideach, tabharfaimid forbhreathnú ar fhoinsí sonraí agus ar ailtireachtaí samhlacha chun feidhmíocht úrscothach a bhaint amach le haistriúchán cainte ceann go ceann do theangacha ard-acmhainne agus íseal-acmhainní araon. Ina theannta sin, pléifimid modhanna chun anailís a dhéanamh ar na réitigh atá beartaithe, chomh maith leis na dúshláin a bhíonn le sárú agus samhlacha aistrithe cainte á gcur i bhfeidhm ar fheidhmchláir fhíorshaolacha.', 'ka': 'სიტყვების გაგრძელება არის სიტყვების გაგრძელება ერთი ენაში, როგორც ტიპულად ტექსტის სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა, როგ ბოლო წლის განსაგულისხმების ინტერესტი აღმოჩენა, მაგრამ ბოლო წარმატებული პროგრამები განსაგულისხმების განსაგულისხმებისთვის ორივე საქმებისთვის ახალი შესაძლებლობა ერთადერთი მოდელურის გამოყენებ ამ სტუტორიაში ჩვენ შევცვალობთ ტექნოგიები, რომლებიც გამოყენებულია სიტყვების გაგრძელებაზე. ტრადიციონალური კაკადის გადაწყვეტიდან, ჩვენ მონაცემების ფოსტების და მოდელური აქტიქტიქტურების სახელსაწყისი გავაკეთებთ სახელსაწყისი სახელსაწყისი, რომელიც სახელსაწყისი გადაწყვეტილი დამატებით, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ პროცემები, რომლებიც გავაკეთებთ განსაზღვრებული გარეშე განსაზღვრებების ანალიზაციას, და განსაზღვრებების განსაზღვრებების განსაზღვრების მოდელების გამ', 'hu': 'A beszédfordítás az egyik nyelven történő beszédfordítás jellemzően a másik nyelven történő szövegre történő fordítása, amelyet hagyományosan az automatikus beszédfelismerés és a gépi fordítás kombinációjával hajtanak végre. A beszédfordítás sok éve vonzza az érdeklődést, de a mélytanulás legutóbbi sikeres alkalmazása mindkét egyes feladatra új lehetőségeket teremt a közös modellezés révén, amit ma "end-to-end beszédfordításnak" nevezünk. Ebben a bemutatóban bemutatjuk a beszédfordítás korszerű kutatásában alkalmazott technikákat. A hagyományos kaszkádos megközelítésből kiindulva áttekintést nyújtunk az adatforrásokról és a modellarchitektúrákról annak érdekében, hogy a legkorszerűbb teljesítményt érjünk el a csúcsminőségű és alacsony erőforrású nyelvek beszédfordításával. Ezenkívül megvitatjuk a javasolt megoldások elemzésének módszereit, valamint a beszédfordítási modellek valós alkalmazásokhoz való alkalmazása során felmerülő kihívásokat.', 'el': 'Η μετάφραση ομιλίας είναι η μετάφραση ομιλίας σε μια γλώσσα τυπικά σε κείμενο σε άλλη, που παραδοσιακά επιτυγχάνεται μέσω ενός συνδυασμού αυτόματης αναγνώρισης ομιλίας και μηχανικής μετάφρασης. Η μετάφραση ομιλίας έχει προσελκύσει ενδιαφέρον εδώ και πολλά χρόνια, αλλά οι πρόσφατες επιτυχείς εφαρμογές της βαθιάς μάθησης και στις δύο μεμονωμένες εργασίες έχουν επιτρέψει νέες ευκαιρίες μέσω της κοινής μοντελοποίησης, σε αυτό που σήμερα αποκαλούμε "ολοκληρωμένη μετάφραση ομιλίας". Σε αυτό το σεμινάριο θα παρουσιάσουμε τις τεχνικές που χρησιμοποιούνται στην έρευνα αιχμής σχετικά με τη μετάφραση ομιλίας. Ξεκινώντας από την παραδοσιακή προσέγγιση, θα δώσουμε μια επισκόπηση των πηγών δεδομένων και των αρχιτεκτονικών μοντέλων για να επιτύχουμε επιδόσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας με ολοκληρωμένη μετάφραση ομιλίας τόσο για γλώσσες υψηλού όσο και χαμηλού πόρου. Επιπλέον, θα συζητήσουμε μεθόδους αξιολόγησης των προτεινόμενων λύσεων, καθώς και τις προκλήσεις που αντιμετωπίζει η εφαρμογή μοντέλων μετάφρασης ομιλίας σε πραγματικές εφαρμογές.', 'it': 'La traduzione vocale è la traduzione del parlato in una lingua tipicamente in testo in un\'altra, tradizionalmente realizzata attraverso una combinazione di riconoscimento vocale automatico e traduzione automatica. La traduzione vocale ha attirato interesse per molti anni, ma le recenti applicazioni di successo del deep learning ad entrambi i compiti individuali hanno permesso nuove opportunità attraverso la modellazione congiunta, in quella che oggi chiamiamo "traduzione vocale end-to-end". In questo tutorial introdurremo le tecniche utilizzate nella ricerca all\'avanguardia sulla traduzione vocale. Partendo dall\'approccio tradizionale a cascata, forniremo una panoramica sulle fonti di dati e sulle architetture dei modelli per ottenere prestazioni all\'avanguardia con traduzione vocale end-to-end per linguaggi ad alta e bassa risorsa. Inoltre, discuteremo metodi per valutare le soluzioni proposte, nonché le sfide affrontate nell\'applicazione di modelli di traduzione vocale per applicazioni reali.', 'kk': 'Сөйлеу - бір тілде сөйлеу аудармасы, әдетте, басқа тілде мәтінде, әдетте, автоматты сөйлеу мен машинаның аудармасынан біріктірілген, аудармасы. Сөйлеу аудармасы көп жыл бойынша қызықтық болды, бірақ бұл жеке тапсырмалар үшін жаңа мүмкіндіктерді біріктіру үшін жаңа мүмкіндіктерді қолдануға мүмкіндік берді. Бүгін біз "end-to-end speech translation" деп ат Бұл оқушылықта сөйлеу аудармасында қолданылатын техникаларды таңдаймыз. Әдетті каскадтық тәртібінен бастап, біз деректер көзі мен архитектуралар үшін оның соңғы сөйлеу тілдерінің күйіне жұмыс істеу үшін, жоғары және төменгі ресурстар тілдеріне аудару үшін, мәліметтер Қосымша, біз ұсынылған шешімдерді анализ ету әдістерін, әлемдік қолданбалар үшін сөйлеу үлгілерін қолдану үшін басқа мәселелерді талқылаймыз.', 'lt': 'Kalbos vertimas – kalbos vertimas viena kalba paprastai į kitą tekstą, tradiciškai atliekamas naudojant automatinio kalbos pripažinimo ir mašininio vertimo derinį. Kalbų vertimas daugelį metų pritraukė susidomėjimą, tačiau neseniai sėkmingas gilaus mokymosi taikymas abiem atskiroms užduotims suteiknaujų galimybių bendrai modeliuojant tai, ką šiandien vadiname „kalbų vertimu nuo pabaigos“. Šiame pamokyme pristatysime šiuolaikinių kalbos vertimo mokslinių tyrimų metodus. Pradėdami nuo tradicinio kaskadinio požiūrio, pateiksime duomenų šaltinių ir modelių architektūrų apžvalgą, kad būtų pasiekti pažangiausi rezultatai, kai kalbos vertimas iš karto į galą bus naudojamas tiek didelės, tiek mažai išteklių turinčioms kalboms. Be to, diskutuosime apie siūlomų sprendimų analizės metodus ir iššūkius, su kuriais susiduriama taikant kalbos vertimo modelius realiajame pasaulyje.', 'mk': 'Speech translation is the translation of speech in one language typically to text in another, traditionally accomplished through a combination of automatic speech recognition and machine translation.  Преводот на говорот привлече интерес со многу години, но неодамнешните успешни апликации на длабоко учење на двете индивидуални задачи овозможија нови можности преку заедничко моделирање, во она што денес го нарекуваме „превод од крај до крај на говорот“. Во овој наставник ќе ги воведеме техниките кои се користат во најновите истражувања за превод на говорот. Почнувајќи од традиционалниот каскадиран пристап, ќе дадеме преглед на изворите на податоци и моделните архитектури за постигнување на најсовремени резултати со превод од крај до крај на говор за јазици со високи и ниски ресурси. Покрај тоа, ќе разговараме за методите за проценка на анализите на предложените решенија, како и за предизвиците со кои се соочуваат при апликацијата на моделите за преведување на говорот за реалните апликации.', 'ms': "Terjemahan ucapan adalah terjemahan ucapan dalam satu bahasa biasanya ke teks dalam bahasa lain, tradisional dilakukan melalui kombinasi pengenalan ucapan automatik dan terjemahan mesin. Terjemahan ucapan telah menarik minat selama bertahun-tahun, tetapi aplikasi yang berjaya baru-baru ini untuk belajar dalam kedua-dua tugas individu telah membolehkan peluang baru melalui model bersama, dalam apa yang kita panggil hari ini `terjemahan ucapan akhir-akhir.' Dalam tutorial ini kita akan memperkenalkan teknik yang digunakan dalam kajian terbaik tentang terjemahan ucapan. Mulai dari pendekatan tradisional, kami akan memberikan pandangan ringkasan pada sumber data dan arkitektur model untuk mencapai prestasi state-of-the-art dengan terjemahan ucapan akhir-akhir untuk kedua-dua bahasa sumber tinggi dan rendah. In addition, we will discuss methods to evaluate analyze the proposed solutions, as well as the challenges faced when applying speech translation models for real-world applications.", 'mt': "It-traduzzjoni tal-kelma hija t-traduzzjoni tad-diskors f’lingwa waħda tipikament għat-test f’oħra, li tradizzjonalment issir permezz ta’ kombinazzjoni ta’ rikonoxximent awtomatiku tad-diskors u traduzzjoni bil-magna. It-traduzzjoni tal-kelma attirat interess għal bosta snin, iżda l-applikazzjonijiet reċenti ta’ suċċess ta’ tagħlim profond għaż-żewġ kompiti individwali ppermettew opportunitajiet ġodda permezz ta’ mudell konġunt, f’dak li llum jissejħu “traduzzjoni tad-diskors minn tmiem sa tmiem”. F’dan it-tutorjal se nintroduċu t-tekniki użati fir-riċerka avvanzata dwar it-traduzzjoni tad-diskors. Mill-approċċ tradizzjonali każat, se nagħtu ħarsa ġenerali lejn is-sorsi tad-dejta u l-arkitetturi mudelli biex inkisbu l-prestazzjoni l-aktar avvanzata bit-traduzzjoni tad-diskors minn tarf sa tarf kemm għal lingwi b’riżorsi għoljin kif ukoll baxxi. Barra minn hekk, se niddiskutu metodi biex jevalwaw l-analiżi tas-soluzzjonijiet proposti, kif ukoll l-isfidi ffaċċjati meta jiġu applikati mudelli ta' traduzzjoni tad-diskors għall-applikazzjonijiet fid-dinja reali.", 'ml': 'സംസാരം പരിഭാഷ ഒരു ഭാഷയില്\u200d സാധാരണമായി മറ്റൊരു ഭാഷയില്\u200d പദാവലിയിലേക്ക് വായിച്ചുതരുന്നതാണ്. പാഠമായി സ്വയം സംസാരിക്കുന് സംസാരം പരിഭാഷണത്തിന് പല വര്\u200dഷങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും താല്പര്യമുണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. പക്ഷെ രണ്ടു പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന പ്രയോഗത്തിന്റ ഈ വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തില്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന വിഭാഷണത്തിന്റെ പരിശോധന വെട്ടിമുറിച്ച് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന സാങ്ക പാരമ്പര്യത്തില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള അസാധാരണയില്\u200d നിന്ന് തുടങ്ങുന്നത് നമ്മള്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ സ്രോതസ്സുകള്\u200dക്കും മോഡല്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടുകള്\u200dക്കും ഒരു പരിശോധനവും കൊടുക്കും. അത കൂടാതെ, നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട തീരുമാനങ്ങളെ പരിശോധിക്കാനുള്ള രീതികളെക്കുറിച്ചും സംസാരിക്കുന്ന വാക്ക് പരിശോധിക്കുന്ന മ', 'mn': 'Үйлдлийн орчуулалт нь нэг хэл дээр илтгэлийн орчуулалт нь ихэвчлэн өөр хэл дээр илтгэлийн орчуулалт юм. Олон жилийн турш ярианы орчлол нь сонирхолтой болсон. Гэхдээ саяхан гүн гүнзгий суралцах хэрэгслүүд нь хоёр дасгал ажиллагаанд шинэ боломж олгосон. Өнөөдөр бид "end-to-end speech translation" гэж нэрлэдэг. Энэ сургуульд бид илтгэл хөрөнгө оруулахын тулд хэрэглэгдсэн техникуудыг тайлбарлах болно. Уламжлалтай каскаддын арга хэлбэрээс эхлээд бид өгөгдлийн эх үүсвэр болон загварын архитектуруудын талаар анхаарлаа өгөх болно. Мөн бид илтгэл хөрөнгө оруулах арга замыг бодит ертөнцийн хэрэглээний тусламжтайгаар шийдвэрлэх арга замыг талаар ярья.', 'ro': "Traducerea vorbirii este traducerea vorbirii într-o limbă de obicei în text într-o altă limbă, realizată în mod tradițional printr-o combinație de recunoaștere automată a vorbirii și traducere automată. Traducerea vorbirii a atras interes de mulți ani, dar aplicațiile recente de succes ale învățării profunde pentru ambele sarcini individuale au permis noi oportunități prin modelarea comună, în ceea ce astăzi numim `traducerea vorbirii end-to-end.' În acest tutorial vom prezenta tehnicile utilizate în cercetarea de ultimă oră privind traducerea vorbirii. Pornind de la abordarea tradițională în cascadă, vom oferi o imagine de ansamblu asupra surselor de date și arhitecturilor modelului pentru a obține performanțe de ultimă generație cu traducere end-to-end de vorbire atât pentru limbile cu resurse mari, cât și pentru cele cu resurse reduse. În plus, vom discuta metode de evaluare a soluțiilor propuse, precum și provocările cu care se confruntă atunci când se aplică modele de traducere vocală pentru aplicații din lumea reală.", 'sr': 'Prevod govora je prevod govora na jednom jeziku obično na tekst na drugom, tradicionalno postignut kroz kombinaciju automatskog priznanja govora i prevoda mašine. Prijevod govora privlačio je interes mnogo godina, ali nedavne uspešne aplikacije dubokog učenja na obje individualne zadatke omogućile su nove mogućnosti putem zajedničkog modela, u onome što danas zovemo "prevod govora do kraja". U ovom nastavniku predstavićemo tehnike koje se koriste u istraživanju prekida govora. Počevši od tradicionalnog kaskadnog pristupa, predaćemo pregled izvora podataka i modela arhitekture kako bi postigli postupak umjetnosti sa prevodom govora na kraju do kraja za jezike visokih i niskih resursa. Osim toga, razgovaraćemo o metodama za procjenu analize predloženih rješenja, kao i izazovima sa kojima se suočavaju kada primjenjujemo modele prevoda govora za aplikacije realnog svijeta.', 'pl': 'Tłumaczenie mowy to tłumaczenie mowy w jednym języku typowo na tekst w innym, tradycyjnie realizowane poprzez połączenie automatycznego rozpoznawania mowy i tłumaczenia maszynowego. Tłumaczenie mowy cieszy się zainteresowaniem od wielu lat, ale ostatnie udane zastosowania głębokiego uczenia się do obu poszczególnych zadań umożliwiły nowe możliwości dzięki wspólnemu modelowaniu, w tym, co dziś nazywamy "kompleksowym tłumaczeniem mowy". W tym poradniku przedstawimy techniki stosowane w najnowocześniejszych badaniach nad tłumaczeniem mowy. Zaczynając od tradycyjnego podejścia kaskadowego, podamy przegląd źródeł danych i architektur modeli, aby osiągnąć najnowocześniejszą wydajność dzięki kompleksowemu tłumaczeniu mowy zarówno dla języków o wysokich jak i niskich zasobach. Ponadto omówimy metody oceny proponowanych rozwiązań, jak również wyzwania stojące przy stosowaniu modeli tłumaczenia mowy do zastosowań rzeczywistych.', 'no': 'Omsetjinga av språk er omsetjinga av språk i ein språk som oftast er tekst i ein annan, tradisjonell fullført gjennom ein kombinasjon av automatisk oppgjevning av språk og maskinsomsetjing. Språk-omsetjinga har attrakta interesse i mange år, men dei siste suksessfulle program for dyppa læring til begge oppgåver har slått på nye muligheter gjennom saman modellering, i det vi i dag kallar «end-to-end talomsetjing». I denne opplæringa vil vi introdusera teknikkene som vert brukte i utklipp av utforsking om taleomsetjing. På starten av den tradisjonelle kaskaderte tilnærminga vil vi gje ei oversikt over datakjelder og modeller for å oppnå kunsthandlinga med omsetjinga til slutt til slutt for både høg og låg ressursspråk. I tillegg vil vi diskutera metodane for å evaluera dei foreslåde løysingane, og utfordringane som står opp når taleomsetjingsmodulane brukar for verkelege programmer.', 'si': 'භාෂාව භාෂාවේ භාෂාව සමාන්\u200dයයෙන් වෙන භාෂාවේ භාෂාවේ භාෂාව, ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විදියට ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය කත වාර්තාව අවුරුදු ගොඩක් ගොඩක් විශේෂයෙන් වාර්තාව ඇතුල් කරලා තියෙනවා, නමුත් අවස්ථාවක් ගොඩක් සාර්ථක විදියට ගොඩක් සාර්ථක විදියට ඉ මේ ප්\u200dරධානයේ අපි කතා පරිවාදය සඳහා භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජන විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dතියක් ප සාමාන්\u200dය කැස්කේඩ් විදියට පටන් ගන්න, අපි දත්ත මූල්\u200dයය සහ මනුස්ත්\u200dරපත් විදියට පරීක්ෂණයක් දෙන්නම්, අන්තිම වචන භාෂාවට අන්තිම ව ඒ වගේම, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්ලේෂනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරවේශනය කතා කරමු, සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්ලේෂනය කරමු, කතා වාර්තාව අනුවර්ත', 'so': 'Turjumista afku waa turjumista luqad oo sida caadiga ah u qoran qoraal kale, sida caadiga ah waxaa lagu dhameeyay isku xiriir aqoonsashada hadalka iyo turjumista machine. Turjumista hadalku wuxuu ku guulaystay xiiso badan sano, laakiin ugu dambeysay codsiga aad u liibaanay waxbarashada aad u weyn ee labadooda shaqo oo gaar ah waxay fursadeen fursado cusub, tusaale wadajir ah, taas oo aan maanta ugu magacaabno turjumaadka hadalka dhammaadka ilaa dhammaadka. Waxbarashadan ayaannu ku soo bandhigi karnaa teknolojiyada lagu isticmaalayo goob-baaritaanka afka ah ee turjumista hadalka. Sidii aan ka bilaabo qaababka caadiga ah ee qashinka, waxaan ka sameynayaa warqad ku saabsan manbashada data iyo tusaale-dhismaha, si aan u gaadhno xaaladda farshaxanka oo ugu dambaysta turjubaan luqada sare iyo hoose-resource. Intaas waxaa dheer, waxan ka sheekaynaynaa qaabab aan ku qiimeyno qalabka ay ku fikiraan xalalka la soo jeeday, iyo dhibaatooyin ay ka hor jeedaan marka lagu codsanayo modelalka turjumaadda ee codsiga caalamiga ah.', 'sv': 'Talöversättning är översättning av tal på ett språk vanligtvis till text på ett annat, traditionellt utförd genom en kombination av automatisk taligenkänning och maskinöversättning. Talöversättning har väckt intresse under många år, men de senaste framgångsrika tillämpningarna av djupinlärning till båda enskilda uppgifter har möjliggjort nya möjligheter genom gemensam modellering, i vad vi idag kallar "end-to-end talöversättning". I denna handledning kommer vi att introducera de tekniker som används i banbrytande forskning om talöversättning. Med utgångspunkt i det traditionella kaskadbaserade tillvägagångssättet kommer vi att ge en översikt över datakällor och modellarkitekturer för att uppnå toppmodern prestanda med end-to-end talöversättning för både hög- och lågresursspråk. Dessutom kommer vi att diskutera metoder för att utvärdera de föreslagna lösningarna samt de utmaningar som ställs inför vid tillämpning av talöversättningsmodeller för verkliga tillämpningar.', 'ur': "کلام کی ترجمہ ایک زبان میں ایک زبان کی ترجمہ ہے جو ایک زبان میں معمولاً دوسری زبان کی ترجمہ کرتی ہے، جو آٹوٹی کلام کی شناخت اور ماشین ترجمہ کے ذریعہ پوری ہوتی ہے۔ کلام کی ترجمہ بہت سی سالوں کے لئے علاقه اٹھائی گئی ہے، لیکن اچھے موفق کاروبار دونوں شخصی کاروباروں کے لئے بہت سی سیکھنے کے لئے نئی فرصت موفق ہوگئی ہیں، جو آج ہم کہتے ہیں 'end-to-end speech translation'. یہ تعلیم میں ہم کلام ترجمہ کے بارے میں استعمال کی تکنیک پیش کریں گے۔ سنتی کاسکڈ کے طریقے سے شروع کیا گیا ہے، ہم نے ڈیٹا سورج اور موڈل معماری کے بارے میں ایک اوورویز دیں گے کہ ان کی حالت میں هنر کی فعالیت پہنچ سکیں اور ان دونوں کے لئے اچھی اور کم منبع زبانوں کی ترجمہ کے ساتھ پائیں گے. اس کے علاوہ، ہم طریقے سے بحث کریں گے کہ پیشنهاد کے حل کا تحلیل کریں، اور بات کی ترجمہ موڈل کو حقیقی دنیاوی کاربریوں کے لئے استعمال کریں۔", 'ta': 'பேச்சு மொழிமொழியில் பேச்சின் மொழிமாற்றி வழக்கமாக மற்றொரு மொழியில் உரையில் மொழிபெயர்ப்பாகும், வழக்கமாக தானியக் பேச்சு மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பல ஆண்டுகளுக்கு ஆர்வம் ஏற்படுத்தியுள்ளது. ஆனால் சமீபத்தில் ஆழமான கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் பயன்பாடுகள் இருவருக்கும் வெற்றிகரமாக இரு இந்த பொருளில் நாம் பேச்சு மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட தொழில்நுட்பத்தை அறிவிக்க மரபார்ந்த நிலையிலிருந்து பாதிக்கப்பட்ட செயல்பாட்டிலிருந்து தொடங்கியது, நாம் தரவு மூலங்கள் மற்றும் மாதிரி உருவாக்கங்களை மேலோடு பார்வை கொடுக் மேலும், நாம் முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட தீர்வுகளை ஆய்வு செய்ய முறைகளையும், பேச்சு மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மாதிரிகளைப் பயன்படுத்தும் போத', 'uz': 'Speech translation is the translation of speech in one language typically to text in another, traditionally accomplished through a combination of automatic speech recognition and machine translation.  Talab tarjima qilish bir necha yil davomida qiziqaradi, lekin eng yaqinda muvaffaqiyatli o\'rganish dasturlari bu ikkita vazifalarning eng muvaffaqiyatli o\'rganish uchun yangi imkoniyatlarni birlashtirish mumkin. Bugun biz "endi to- end" tarjima qilishimiz deb ataymiz. Bu taʼminlovda biz gapirish tarjimasini o\'rganish uchun ishlatilgan teknologizni ko\'rsamiz. Biz taqqiqiy kaskad usulidan boshlanadi, biz maʼlumot manbaslari va model arxituvlari haqida saqlash imkoniyatini bajarishimiz uchun eng oxiri va oxirigi gapirish tarjimasi bilan yuqori va kichik resource tillari uchun tarjima qilamiz. Ko\'pchilik esa, quyidagi suhbatlarni aniqlash usullarini va gapirish modellarini xavfli dunyo dasturlari uchun tarjima qilish uchun qidirish usullarini boshqaramiz.', 'vi': "Bản dịch phát âm là bản dịch ngôn ngữ của ngôn ngữ trong một ngôn ngữ điển hình thành chữ khác, theo truyền thống được hoàn thành bằng sự kết hợp nhận dạng ngôn ngữ tự động và dịch thuật máy. Bản dịch phát âm đã thu hút nhiều năm, nhưng những ứng dụng thành công gần đây của việc học sâu học cho cả hai công việc cá nhân đã tạo ra cơ hội mới nhờ kết hợp người mẫu, trong cái mà chúng ta gọi là'tận cùng dịch thuyết'. Trong bài tập này, chúng tôi sẽ giới thiệu kỹ thuật sử dụng trong nghiên cứu tiên tiến về dịch thuật ngôn ngữ. Bắt đầu từ phương pháp hợp điển truyền thống, chúng tôi sẽ cung cấp một thông tin về các nguồn dữ liệu và các kiến trúc mẫu để đạt được trình độ nghệ thuật hiện đại với dịch ngôn ngữ kết thúc cho cả các ngôn ngữ cao và nhỏ. Chúng ta sẽ thảo luận các phương pháp để đánh giá các giải pháp đã đề ra, cũng như những thử thách đối mặt khi áp dụng các mô hình dịch giọng nói cho các ứng dụng thế giới thực.", 'bg': 'Речният превод е превод на речта на един език, обикновено на текст на друг, традиционно извършен чрез комбинация от автоматично разпознаване на речта и машинен превод. Речният превод привлича интерес от много години, но последните успешни приложения на дълбокото учене и на двете индивидуални задачи дадоха възможност за нови възможности чрез съвместно моделиране в това, което днес наричаме "от край до край речен превод". В този урок ще представим техниките, използвани в най-съвременните изследвания на речния превод. Започвайки от традиционния каскаден подход, ще дадем преглед на източниците на данни и архитектурите на моделите, за да постигнем най-съвременно представяне с речен превод от край до край за езици с висок и нисък ресурс. В допълнение, ще обсъдим методите за оценка на предложените решения, както и предизвикателствата, пред които се изправят при прилагането на модели за речен превод за приложения от реалния свят.', 'nl': "Spraakvertaling is de vertaling van spraak in de ene taal naar tekst in een andere, traditioneel uitgevoerd door een combinatie van automatische spraakherkenning en machinevertaling. Spraakvertaling trekt al vele jaren belangstelling, maar de recente succesvolle toepassingen van deep learning op beide individuele taken hebben nieuwe mogelijkheden mogelijk gemaakt door gezamenlijke modellering, in wat we vandaag 'end-to-end spraakvertaling' noemen. In deze tutorial introduceren we de technieken die worden gebruikt in cutting-edge onderzoek naar spraakvertaling. Uitgaande van de traditionele cascade benadering geven we een overzicht van gegevensbronnen en modelarchitecturen om state-of-the-art prestaties te bereiken met end-to-end spraakvertaling voor zowel high- als low-resource talen. Daarnaast bespreken we methoden om de voorgestelde oplossingen te analyseren, evenals de uitdagingen waarmee we geconfronteerd worden bij het toepassen van spraakvertaalmodellen voor real-world toepassingen.", 'da': "Taleoversættelse er oversættelsen af tale på et sprog typisk til tekst på et andet, traditionelt udført gennem en kombination af automatisk talegenkendelse og maskinoversættelse. Taleoversættelse har tiltrukket interesse i mange år, men de seneste vellykkede anvendelser af dyb læring til begge individuelle opgaver har givet mulighed for nye muligheder gennem fælles modellering, i det, vi i dag kalder `end-to-end taleoversættelse.' I denne tutorial vil vi introducere teknikker, der anvendes i banebrydende forskning om taleoversættelse. Med udgangspunkt i den traditionelle kaskadeformede tilgang vil vi give et overblik over datakilder og modelarkitekturer for at opnå state-of-the-art performance med end-to-end taleoversættelse til både high- og low-resource sprog. Derudover vil vi diskutere metoder til at evaluere de foreslåede løsninger samt de udfordringer, der står over for, når du anvender taleoversættelsesmodeller til virkelige applikationer.", 'hr': 'Prevod govora je prevod govora na jednom jeziku obično tekstu na drugom, tradicionalno postignut kroz kombinaciju automatskog priznanja govora i prevoda strojeva. Prijevod govora privlačio je interes mnogo godina, ali nedavne uspješne primjene dubokog učenja na oba pojedinačnog zadatka omogućile su nove mogućnosti putem zajedničkog modela, u onome što danas zovemo "prevod govora do kraja". U ovom nastavniku predstavit ćemo tehnike koje se koriste u istraživanju rezanja granica o prevodu govora. Počevši od tradicionalnog kaskadiranog pristupa, predaćemo pregled izvora podataka i modelnih arhitektura kako bi postigli postupak umjetnosti s prevodom govora na kraju do kraja za jezike visokih i niskih resursa. Osim toga, razgovarat ćemo o metodama za procjenu analize predloženih rješenja, kao i izazovima s kojima se suočavaju kada primjenjujemo modele prevoda govora za primjene stvarnog svijeta.', 'id': "Terjemahan pidato adalah terjemahan pidato dalam satu bahasa biasanya ke teks dalam bahasa lain, tradisional dilakukan melalui kombinasi pengenal pidato otomatis dan terjemahan mesin. Speech translation has attracted interest for many years, but the recent successful applications of deep learning to both individual tasks have enabled new opportunities through joint modeling, in what we today call `end-to-end speech translation.'  Dalam tutorial ini kita akan memperkenalkan teknik yang digunakan dalam penelitian terbaik tentang terjemahan pidato. Mulai dari pendekatan tradisional, kami akan memberikan pandangan panjang pada sumber data dan arsitektur model untuk mencapai prestasi state-of-the-art dengan terjemahan pidato akhir-akhir untuk bahasa-bahasa tinggi dan rendah sumber daya. Selain itu, kami akan mendiskusikan metode untuk menganalisis solusi yang diusulkan, serta tantangan yang dihadapkan ketika menerapkan model terjemahan pidato untuk aplikasi dunia nyata.", 'de': 'Sprachübersetzung ist die Übersetzung von Sprache in einer Sprache typischerweise in Text in einer anderen, traditionell durch eine Kombination aus automatischer Spracherkennung und maschineller Übersetzung. Sprachübersetzung ist seit vielen Jahren auf Interesse gestoßen, aber die jüngsten erfolgreichen Anwendungen von Deep Learning auf beide Einzelaufgaben haben neue Möglichkeiten durch gemeinsame Modellierung eröffnet, was wir heute als "End-to-End-Sprachübersetzung" bezeichnen. In diesem Tutorial werden wir die Techniken vorstellen, die in der Spitzenforschung zur Sprachübersetzung verwendet werden. Ausgehend vom traditionellen kaskadierten Ansatz werden wir einen Überblick über Datenquellen und Modellarchitekturen geben, um State-of-the-Art-Performance mit End-to-End-Sprachübersetzung für High- und Low-Resource-Sprachen zu erreichen. Darüber hinaus diskutieren wir Methoden zur Evaluierung der vorgeschlagenen Lösungen sowie die Herausforderungen bei der Anwendung von Sprachübersetzungsmodellen für reale Anwendungen.', 'ko': "음성 번역은 한 언어의 음성을 다른 언어의 텍스트로 번역하는 것으로 전통적으로 자동 음성 식별과 기계 번역의 결합을 통해 이루어진다.여러 해 동안 음성 번역은 사람들의 흥미를 끌었지만 최근에 두 가지 단독 임무에서 깊이 있게 공부한 성공적인 응용은 연합 모델링(우리가 오늘날'단말기부터 단말기까지의 음성 번역'이라고 부른다)을 통해 새로운 기회를 가져왔다.본 강좌에서 우리는 음성 번역의 최첨단 연구에서 사용하는 기술을 소개할 것이다.전통적인 등급 연결 방법부터 우리는 데이터 원본과 모델 구조에 대해 개술하여 첨단과 저단 언어의 끝에서 끝까지의 음성 번역의 최신 성능을 실현할 것이다.또한 제안된 해결 방안을 평가하고 분석하는 방법, 음성 번역 모델을 실제 응용에 응용할 때 직면하는 도전도 논의할 것이다.", 'fa': 'ترجمه سخنرانی، ترجمه سخنرانی در یک زبان معمولاً به متن در یک زبان است، که به طور سنتی از طریق ترجمه شناسایی سخنرانی و ترجمه ماشین خودکار انجام می شود. ترجمه سخنرانی برای سال\u200cهای زیادی علاقه\u200cای را جذب کرده است، ولی کاربردهای موفقیت اخیر از یادگیری عمیق برای هر دو کار شخصی، فرصت\u200cهای جدید را از طریق مدل\u200cسازی مشترک، در آنچه امروز می\u200cگوییم «ترجمه\u200cسازی سخنرانی به پایان». در این تدریس ما تکنیک\u200cهای استفاده در تحقیقات قطعه\u200cای از ترجمه سخنرانی را معرفی می\u200cکنیم. از طریق کاسکد سنتی شروع می\u200cکنیم، ما یک نگاهی از منابع داده\u200cها و معماری\u200cهای مدل را برای رسیدن عملکرد هنری با ترجمه\u200cهای سخنرانی پایان و پایان برای زبان\u200cهای بالا و کم منبع می\u200cدهیم. در addition, we will discuss methods to evaluate the proposed solutions, as well as the challenges facing when applying speech translation models for real-world applications.', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya kujieleza ni tafsiri ya hotuba kwa lugha moja kawaida kwa kutumia ujumbe mwingine, kwa utamaduni uliotekelezwa kwa mfungano wa kutambua hotuba na tafsiri ya mashine. Tafsiri ya kujieleza imevutiwa na maslahi kwa miaka mingi, lakini matumizi ya hivi karibuni ya mafanikio ya kujifunza kwa kazi zote za watu binafsi yamewaweza fursa mpya kupitia muundo wa pamoja, katika kile tunachokiita ‘tafsiri ya mwisho ya hotuba’. Katika somo hili tutaonyesha mbinu zilizotumiwa katika kukata tafiti za upande wa kutafsiri hotuba. Kuanzia mbinu za kitamaduni zilizoharibiwa, tutatoa taarifa juu ya vyanzo vya taarifa na majengo ya model ili kufikia hali ya sanaa kwa kutafsiri hotuba ya mwisho kwa lugha za juu na rasilimali chini. Zaidi ya hayo, tutajadili njia za kutathmini suluhisho hilo, pamoja na changamoto zinazokabiliwa wakati wa kutumia mifano ya kutafsiri kwa matumizi ya dunia halisi.', 'tr': 'Sözler bir dilde adatça metin içine terjime edilýär, adatça awtomatik çykyş tanyş we maşynyň terjime edilýän bir terjime. Söz terjimesi birnäçe ýyllardan bäri gyzyklandy, ýöne şu wagtda `end-to-end speech terjime etmek üçin iň soňky başarnykly öwrenmeler üçin täze bir modelleşdirim bilen täze bir mümkinçilik mümkinçilikleri yaratdy. Bu tutumda çykyş terjimesinde ýüze çykyş barlamasynda ullanýan teknikleri tanyşdyrjak. Däpli kaskady ýagdaýdan başlanýan we munuň üsti we düşük çeşmeleri üçin sungat täbligini ýetip bilmek üçin data çeşmeleri we nusgalary barada pikir berjek. Munuň üstine çözümleri çözmek üçin çözümleri çözmek üçin çözümleri we çözümleri çözmek üçin çözümleri çözeriz.', 'sq': 'Përkthimi i fjalës është përkthimi i fjalës në një gjuhë tipikisht në tekst në një tjetër, kryer tradicionalisht nëpërmjet një kombinimi të njohjes automatike të fjalës dhe përkthimit automatik. Përkthimi i fjalës ka tërhequr interes për shumë vite, por aplikimet e fundit të suksesshme të mësimit të thellë për të dy detyrat individuale kanë mundësuar mundësi të reja nëpërmjet modelimit të përbashkët, në atë që sot e quajmë "përkthimi i fjalës nga fundi në fund." Në këtë mësim do të futim teknikat e përdorura në kërkimet më të mëdha mbi përkthimin e fjalës. Duke filluar nga qasja tradicionale e kaskaduar, ne do të japim një përmbledhje mbi burimet e të dhënave dhe arkitekturat modelore për të arritur shfaqjen më të lartë me përkthimin e fjalës nga fundi në fund për gjuhët me burime të larta dhe të ulëta. Përveç kësaj, do të diskutojmë metodat për të vlerësuar analizën e zgjidhjeve të propozuara si dhe sfidat me të cilat ndeshen kur zbatohen modelet e përkthimit të fjalës për aplikimet e botës reale.', 'af': "Spraak vertaling is die vertaling van spraak in een taal tipies na teks in 'n ander, tradisioneel gevolg deur 'n kombinasie van outomatiese spreek erken en masjien vertaling. Spraak vertaling het vir baie jaar belang aantrek, maar die onlangse suksesvolle toepassings van diep leer tot beide individuele taak het nuwe moontlikhede aangeskakel deur joint modeling, in wat ons vandag noem `end-to-end speech translation.` In hierdie onderwerp sal ons die teknike voorsien wat gebruik word in die knip-rand onderwerp oor spreek vertaling. Beginne van die tradisionele kaskadeerde toegang, sal ons 'n oorskou gegee oor data bronne en model arkitektuur om state-of-the-kuns prestasie te bereik met end-to-end spraak vertaling vir beide hoë en lae-hulpbron tale. In addition, we will discuss methods to evaluate the proposed solutions, as well as the challenges facing when applying speech translation models for real-world applications.", 'am': 'የንግግር ትርጓሜ ትርጉም በአንድ ቋንቋ ላይ በተቀድሞ ለመጽሐፍ በሌላ በአንድ ቋንቋ ውስጥ የተፈጸመ፣ ባሕላዊው በንግግር ማስታወቂያ እና ማሻሻል ትርጓሜ የተፈጸመ ነው፡፡ ንግግር ትርጉም በብዙ ዓመታት ውስጥነት አቀረበ፤ ነገር ግን በቅርብ ጊዜ ለሁለቱ ስራዎችን ለጥልቅ ትምህርት የተጠቃሚ ፕሮግራሞች አዲስ ስርዓት በመጠቀም አቅራቢያ ማድረግ አግኝቷል፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት ውስጥ በንግግር ትርጓሜን ለመግለጽ የሚጠቀሙትን ስልጣናዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ከባሕላዊው ደረጃ መግለጫ ጀምሮ፣ የዳታ ምንጮች እና የሞዴል አካውንቲክሮችን እና የዓርስተ-አርእስት እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የተዘጋጀውን መፍትሄቶችን በማስተዋል እና ለእውነተኛ ዓለም ፕሮግራሞች የንግግር ትርጉም ዓይነቶችን ለመጠቀም የሚቃወሙትን ጥቃት እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': "Խոսքի թարգմանությունը խոսքի թարգմանությունն է մեկ լեզվով, սովորաբար մեկ այլ լեզվով, որը ավանդական կերպ է հասնում խոսքի ավտոմատիկ ճանաչման և մեքենային թարգմանության միջոցով: Speech translation has attracted interest for many years, but the recent successful applications of deep learning to both individual tasks have enabled new opportunities through joint modeling, in what we today call `end-to-end speech translation.'  Այս դասարանում մենք ներկայացնենք խոսքի թարգմանման վերջնական հետազոտությունների մեթոդները: Սկսելով ավանդական կասկադի մոտեցումից, մենք կտրամադրենք տվյալների աղբյուրների և մոդելների ճարտարապետության ընդհանուր պատկերացում, որպեսզի հասնենք բարձր և ցածր ռեսուրսների լեզուների վերջ-վերջ խոսքի թարգմանման միջոցով: Ավելին, մենք կքննարկենք նախագծված լուծումների վերլուծության մեթոդները, ինչպես նաև այն մարտահրավերները, որոնց հանդիպում է խոսքի թարգմանման մոդելների կիրառումը իրական աշխարհի ծրագրերի համար:", 'bn': 'ভাষা অনুবাদ একটি ভাষায় ভাষার অনুবাদ সাধারণত অন্য কোন ভাষায় লেখার অনুবাদ, ঐতিহ্যবাহী ভাষণ স্বয়ংক্রিয় ভাষণ স্বীকৃতি এবং মে ভাষণ অনুবাদ অনেক বছরের জন্য আগ্রহ আকর্ষণ করেছে, কিন্তু সাম্প্রতিক ক্ষেত্রে ব্যক্তিগত কাজের জন্য গভীর শিক্ষার সাফল্যের অ্যাপ্লিকেশন যোগাযোগ মডেলিং ম এই শিক্ষার্থীতে আমরা বক্তৃতা অনুবাদের বিভিন্ন ভাষণ কেটে ফেলতে ব্যবহৃত প্রযুক্তিগুলো পরিচয় করিয়ে দেব। ঐতিহ্যবাহী ক্যাস্ক্যাকেডের প্রযুক্তি থেকে শুরু করা থেকে আমরা ডাটা উৎস এবং মডেল কাঠামো সম্পর্কে একটি পর্যবেক্ষণ প্রদান করবো যাতে এই শিল্পের পরিস্থিতি প্রদর এছাড়াও আমরা প্রস্তাবিত সমাধানের বিশ্লেষণের মূল্য নিয়ে আলোচনা করি এবং বাস্তব বিশ্বব্যাপী অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের জন্য ভাষণ অনুবাদ মডেল প্রয়', 'az': 'Sözlük çeviri bir dildə sözlərin çevirildiyi tərzdə başqa dildə mətnə çevirildir. Bu tərzdə, avtomatik sözlərin tanıması və maşın çevirilməsi ilə müəyyən edilmişdir. Sözlük tercüməsi çox illərdir, amma bu günün "end-to-end speech translation" adlandırdığımız şeylərdə, hər ikisinin böyük öyrənməsinin son başarılı uyğulamaları birlikdə modellik vasitəsilə yeni fırsatlar yaratdı. Bu öyrənməkdə danışmaq üçün istifadə edilən teknikləri tanıyacağıq. Dəstəliyi cascaded tərzindən başlayıb, yüksək və düşük ressurs dillərinin məlumatları üçün məlumatlar mənbələrini və modellər arhitektarını təsbit edəcəyik. Əvvəlcə, təbliğ edilmiş çətinləri analiz etmək üçün metodları, həmçinin sözlərin çevirim modellərini gerçek dünya proqramlarına uyğunlaşdırmaq üçün çəkilən çətinləri də mübahisə edəcəyik.', 'ca': "La traducció de la voz és la traducció de la voz en una llengua típicament al text en una altra, tradicionalment aconseguida a través d'una combinació de reconeixement automàtic de la voz i traducció màquina. La traducció de la llengua ha atraït interès durant molts anys, però les recents aplicacions exitoses d'aprenentatge profund a les dues tasques individuals han fet possible noves oportunitats a través de modelar conjuntament, en el que anomenem avui 'traducció de la llengua final a final'. En aquest tutorial introduirem les tècniques utilitzades en recerca avançada sobre la traducció del discurs. A partir de l'enfocament tradicional cascadet, donarem una visió general sobre les fonts de dades i les arquitectures models per aconseguir un rendiment d'última generació amb traducció fonamental de final a final per llengües d'alta i baixa capacitat. A més, discutirem mètodes per avaluar l'anàlisi de les solucions proposades, així com els reptes que s'enfronten en l'aplicació de models de traducció fonamental a aplicacions del món real.", 'bs': 'Prevod govora je prevod govora na jednom jeziku obično tekstu na drugom, tradicionalno postignut kroz kombinaciju automatskog priznanja govora i prevoda strojeva. Prijevod govora privlačio je interes mnogo godina, ali nedavne uspješne aplikacije dubokog učenja na obje individualne zadatke omogućile su nove mogućnosti putem zajedničke modele, u onome što danas zovemo "prevod govora do kraja". U ovom nastavniku predstavićemo tehnike koje se koriste u prevodu govora. Počevši od tradicionalnog kaskadnog pristupa, predaćemo pregled izvora podataka i modela arhitekture kako bi postigli postupak umjetnosti sa prevodom govora na kraju do kraja za jezike visokih i niskih resursa. Osim toga, razgovarat ćemo o metodama za procjenu analize predloženih rješenja, kao i izazovima s kojima se suočavaju kada primjenjujemo modele prevoda govora za aplikacije realnog svijeta.', 'cs': 'Překlad řeči je překlad řeči v jednom jazyce typicky do textu v jiném, tradičně prováděný kombinací automatického rozpoznávání řeči a strojového překladu. Překlad řeči přitahuje zájem již mnoho let, ale nedávné úspěšné aplikace hlubokého učení na obě jednotlivé úkoly umožnily nové příležitosti prostřednictvím společného modelování, v tom, co dnes nazýváme "koncový překlad řeči". V tomto návodu představíme techniky používané v špičkovém výzkumu překladu řeči. Na základě tradičního kaskádového přístupu poskytneme přehled o datových zdrojích a modelových architekturách, abychom dosáhli nejmodernějšího výkonu s komplexním překladem řeči pro jazyky s vysokými i nízkými zdroji. Dále budeme diskutovat o metodách hodnocení navržených řešení a výzvách, kterým čelí při aplikaci modelů překladu řeči pro reálné aplikace.', 'et': 'Kõnetõlge on kõne tõlkimine ühes keeles tavaliselt teises tekstis, mida traditsiooniliselt teostatakse automaatse kõnetuvastuse ja masintõlke kombinatsiooni kaudu. Kõne tõlkimine on huvi äratanud juba aastaid, kuid hiljutised edukad sügavõppe rakendused mõlemale individuaalsele ülesandele on võimaldanud uusi võimalusi ühise modelleerimise kaudu, mida tänapäeval nimetame "otsast otsa kõne tõlkimiseks". Selles õpetuses tutvustame tehnikaid, mida kasutatakse tipptasemel uuringutes kõnetõlke. Alustades traditsioonilisest kaskadeeritud lähenemisviisist anname ülevaate andmeallikatest ja mudelite arhitektuuridest, et saavutada tipptasemel jõudlus lõpust lõpuni kõnetõlkega nii suure kui ka vähese ressursiga keeltes. Lisaks arutame väljapakutud lahenduste analüüsimise meetodeid ning väljakutseid, mis seisavad silmitsi kõnetõlke mudelite rakendamisel reaalsetes rakendustes.', 'fi': 'Puhekäännös on puheen kääntäminen yhdelle kielelle tyypillisesti tekstiksi toiselle kielelle, joka perinteisesti suoritetaan automaattisen puheentunnistuksen ja konekäännöksen yhdistelmällä. Puhekääntäminen on herättänyt kiinnostusta jo useiden vuosien ajan, mutta viimeaikaiset onnistuneet syväoppimisen sovellukset molempiin yksittäisiin tehtäviin ovat mahdollistaneet uusia mahdollisuuksia yhteismallinnuksen kautta, mitä tänään kutsumme "päästä päähän puheen kääntämiseksi". Tässä oppaassa esittelemme tekniikoita, joita käytetään puheen kääntämisen huippututkimuksessa. Perinteisestä kaskadisesta lähestymistavasta alkaen annamme yleiskatsauksen tietolähteistä ja malliarkkitehtuurista, jotta saavutetaan huippuluokan suorituskyky sekä korkean että matalan resurssin kielillä. Lisäksi pohdimme menetelmiä, joilla analysoidaan ehdotettuja ratkaisuja, sekä haasteita, joita kohtaamme puheen käännösmallien soveltamisessa todellisiin sovelluksiin.', 'he': 'התרגום של דיבור הוא התרגום של דיבור בשפה אחת בדרך כלל לטקסט בשנייה אחרת, המסורתית מושלמת באמצעות שילוב של זיהוי דיבור אוטומטי ותרגום מכונות. התרגום לדיבורים נמשך עניין במשך שנים רבות, אך היישומים המצליחים האחרונים של לימוד עמוק לשני המשימות האפשרו הזדמנויות חדשות דרך דוגמנים משותפים, במה שאנחנו קוראים היום "התרגום הדיבורים סוף-סוף". במדרון הזה נציג את הטכניקות המשתמשות במחקר חדש על תרגום נאום. בהתחלה מהגישה המסורתית המתוקפת, נתן מבט על מקורות נתונים וארכיטקטורות דוגמניות כדי להשיג ביצועים חדשים עם תורגם נאום סוף-סוף לשפות גבוהות וגבוהות משאבים נמוכות. In addition, we will discuss methods to evaluate analyze the proposed solutions, as well as the challenges faced when applying speech translation models for real-world applications.', 'sk': 'Govorno prevajanje je prevod govora v enem jeziku, običajno v besedilo v drugem jeziku, ki se tradicionalno izvaja s kombinacijo avtomatskega prepoznavanja govora in strojnega prevajanja. Govorno prevajanje je pritegnilo zanimanje že več let, vendar so nedavne uspešne aplikacije globokega učenja pri obeh posameznih nalogah omogočile nove priložnosti s skupnim modeliranjem, kar danes imenujemo "govorno prevajanje od konca do konca". V tej vadnici bomo predstavili tehnike, ki se uporabljajo pri vrhunskih raziskavah govornega prevajanja. Na podlagi tradicionalnega kaskadnega pristopa bomo podali pregled virov podatkov in arhitektur modelov za doseganje najsodobnejše zmogljivosti s prevajanjem govora od konca do konca za jezike z visokimi in nizkimi viri. Poleg tega bomo razpravljali o metodah za oceno analize predlaganih rešitev in izzivih, s katerimi se soočamo pri uporabi modelov govornega prevajanja za aplikacije v realnem svetu.', 'ha': "translation Tsarin magana ya shagala riba wa 'yan shekara mai yawa, kuma amma masu ƙarami da shiryoyin ayuka masu cin nasara a sanar da su masu aikin aiki guda, sun yarda da fursa masu buƙata a cikin shirin da ke samu'a, a cikin abin da Muke kiran `end-to-end' fassarar magana. Daga wannan tudunar, za mu introduce technical waɗanda ake amfani da cikin cutarwa-edge research on fassarar magana. Fara daga hanyarin da aka canza wa kwanan kwanan, za'a ba mu iya samun bayani na sourcen data da shiryoyin ayuka na motsi dõmin ya isa mazaunin-muhimmin-sanar da fassarar magana ta ƙari-zuwa-ƙari wa lughan sarki da kuma ƙasan-resource. Da wannan, zã mu yi jãyayya hanyoyin su yi anadi ga masu buƙata da ake bukatar da shi, da musamman da ake faca idan an application misãlai na fassarar magana wa shiryoyin ayuka masu cikin duniya.", 'jv': 'Where am I Where am I Nang tutorial iki, kita bakal nggunakake tékno sing nggawe nggambar tarjamahan kanggo ngilangno langgar. Mulai ke ditambah akeh dolanan sing perusahaan, kéné bakal ngewehke nggawe tarjamahan karo perusahaan dadi lan architecture model kanggo ngelarang langgar stadu-karo perusahaan langgar sampeyan mulai terjamahan kanggo langgar langgar bantuan ngon akeh-perusahaan langgar. Nambah, awak dhéwé bakal segala macem nggawe maneh kanggo nyeluwih basa sing beraksi perusahaan winih, lan akeh njaluk sing bisa nguasai model itoleh kanggo aplikasi sing nyimpen kanggo awak dhéwé.', 'bo': "Speech translation is the translation of speech in one language typically to text in another, traditionally accomplished through a combination of automatic speech recognition and machine translation. Speech translation has attracted interest for many years, but the recent successful applications of deep learning to both tasks have enabled new opportunities through joint modeling, in what we today call `end-to-end speech translation.' ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་ཕྱོགས་སྨན་གཞུང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ཞིག་བྱེད་དགོས། Starting from the traditional cascaded approach, we will give an overview on data sources and model architectures to achieve state-of-the art performance with end-to-end speech translation for both high-and low-resource languages. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་རིམ་དེ་ལ་སྔོན་འཛུགས་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་གནད་དོན་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་དང་། འཛམ་གླིང་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་དོ"}
